{'en': 'AdapLeR Speeding up Inference by Adaptive Length Reduction', 'ar': 'AdapLeR: تسريع الاستدلال عن طريق تقليل الطول التكيفي', 'fr': "Adapter\xa0: Accélérer l'inférence par réduction adaptative de longueur", 'pt': 'AdaptLeR: Acelerando a inferência por redução adaptativa de comprimento', 'es': 'AdapTer: Aceleración de la inferencia mediante la reducción de longitud adaptativa', 'ja': 'AdapLeR ：アダプティブ長さ低減による推論のスピードアップ', 'zh': 'AdapLeR曰:损益速也', 'hi': 'AdapLeR: अनुकूली लंबाई में कमी द्वारा अनुमान को तेज करना', 'ru': 'AdapLeR: Ускорение вывода за счет адаптивного уменьшения длины', 'ga': 'AdapLeR: Tátail a Bhrosú trí Laghdú Fad Oiriúnaitheach', 'ka': 'AdapLeR', 'hu': 'AdapLeR: A fertőzések felgyorsítása adaptív hosszúságcsökkentéssel', 'it': "AdapLeR: accelerare l'inferenza grazie alla riduzione adattiva della lunghezza", 'lt': 'AdapLeR: Inferencijos spartinimas pritaikomojo ilgio mažinimu', 'kk': 'AdapLeR: Адаптивті ұзындығын азайту', 'mk': 'AdapLeR: забрзување на инференцијата со намалување на адаптивната должина', 'ml': 'AdapLeR: അഡാപ്റ്റിവ് നീളം കുറഞ്ഞു', 'ms': 'AdapLeR: Mempantaskan Inferensi mengikut Pengurangan Panjang Adaptif', 'mt': 'AdapLeR: Li titħaffef l-Inferenza bit-Tnaqqis tat-Tul Adattattiv', 'mn': 'AdapLeR: Адаптив урт багасгах дагуу хурдан багасгах', 'no': 'AdapLeR: Fasting up Inference by Adaptive Length Reduction', 'el': 'Επιτάχυνση του συμπεράσματος με την προσαρμοστική μείωση μήκους', 'pl': 'AdapLeR: Przyspieszenie wniosków dzięki adaptacyjnej redukcji długości', 'ro': 'AdapLeR: Accelerarea infecţiei prin reducerea adaptivă a lungimii', 'sr': 'AdapLeR: ubrzavanje povećanja adaptivnim smanjenjem dužine', 'si': 'AdapLeR', 'so': 'AdapLeR: Speeding up Inference by Adaptive Length Reduction', 'sv': 'AdapLeR: Snabbar upp inferens genom adaptiv längdreduktion', 'ta': 'AdapLeR: Speeding up Inference by Adaptive Length Reduction', 'ur': 'AdapLeR: Adaptive Length Reduction by Speeding up Inference', 'uz': 'AdapLeR: Speeding up Inference by Adaptive Length Reduction', 'vi': 'AdamdLeR: Tăng tốc độ liên lạc qua giảm độ bền Thích hợp', 'bg': 'Ускоряване на заключването чрез адаптивно намаляване на дължината', 'nl': 'AdapLeR: Snellere Inferentie door Adaptieve Lengte Reductie', 'da': 'AdapLeR: Fremskynde infektioner ved hjælp af adaptiv længdereduktion', 'hr': 'AdapLeR: ubrzavanje infekcije prilagođenim smanjenjem dužine', 'de': 'AdapLeR: Beschleunigung der Inferenz durch adaptive Längenreduzierung', 'id': 'AdapLeR: mempercepat Inferensi dengan Pengurangan Panjang Adaptif', 'ko': 'AdapLeR: 사용자 적응 길이 감소를 통한 빠른 추리', 'fa': 'AdapLeR: سرعت افزایش توسط کاهش طول adaptive', 'sw': 'AdapLeR: Kuongezeka kwa Ushindi wa Upunguzo wa Adaptive', 'af': 'AdapLeR: Spoed up Inference deur Adaptive Lengte Reduksie', 'tr': 'AdapLeR', 'sq': 'AdapLeR: Shpejtimi i Inferencës me Shkurtimin e Gjatësisë Adaptive', 'am': 'AdapLeR: Speeding up Inference by Adaptive Long Reduction', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'AdapLeR: Speeding up Inference by Adaptive Length Reduction', 'az': 'AdapLeR: Adaptive Length Reduction', 'bs': 'AdapLeR: ubrzavanje infekcije prilagođenim smanjenjem dužine', 'ca': 'AdapLeR: Acelerar la Inferència per Reducció Adaptiva de Longitud', 'cs': 'AdapLeR: Zrychlení závěru díky adaptivnímu snížení délky', 'et': 'AdapLeR: järelduste kiirendamine kohanduva pikkuse vähendamise abil', 'fi': 'AdapLeR: Nopeuttaa päättelyä mukautuvalla pituuden vähennyksellä', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'LeR: Spending up Infection by Adaftive Long Reducion', 'bo': 'AdapLeR: Speeding up Inference by Adaptive Length Reduction', 'sk': 'AdapLeR: pospešitev sklepanja s prilagodljivim zmanjšanjem dolžine', 'he': 'AdapLeR: להאיץ את התנועה על ידי חיסוך אורך מתאים'}
{'en': 'Pre trained language models have shown stellar performance in various downstream tasks But this usually comes at the cost of high latency and computation hindering their usage in resource limited settings In this work we propose a novel approach for reducing the computational cost of BERT with minimal loss in downstream performance Our method dynamically eliminates less contributing tokens through layers resulting in shorter lengths and consequently lower computational cost To determine the importance of each token representation we train a Contribution Predictor for each layer using a gradient based saliency method Our experiments on several diverse classification tasks show speedups up to 22x during inference time without much sacrifice in performance We also validate the quality of the selected tokens in our method using human annotations in the ERASER benchmark In comparison to other widely used strategies for selecting important tokens such as saliency and attention our proposed method has a significantly lower false positive rate in generating rationales Our code is freely available at https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ar': 'أظهرت النماذج اللغوية المدربة مسبقًا أداءً ممتازًا في مهام مختلفة في المراحل النهائية. ولكن ، يأتي هذا عادةً على حساب زمن الوصول العالي والحساب ، مما يعيق استخدامها في الإعدادات محدودة الموارد. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا لتقليل التكلفة الحسابية لـ BERT مع الحد الأدنى من الخسارة في أداء المصب. تعمل طريقتنا بشكل ديناميكي على التخلص من الرموز المميزة الأقل مساهمة من خلال الطبقات ، مما يؤدي إلى أطوال أقصر وبالتالي تقليل التكلفة الحسابية. لتحديد أهمية كل تمثيل رمزي ، نقوم بتدريب توقع المساهمة لكل طبقة باستخدام طريقة البروز القائمة على التدرج. تُظهر تجاربنا على العديد من مهام التصنيف المتنوعة تسريعًا يصل إلى 22x أثناء وقت الاستدلال دون التضحية كثيرًا في الأداء. نتحقق أيضًا من جودة الرموز المميزة المحددة في طريقتنا باستخدام التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية في معيار ERASER. بالمقارنة مع الاستراتيجيات الأخرى المستخدمة على نطاق واسع لاختيار الرموز المهمة ، مثل البروز والانتباه ، فإن طريقتنا المقترحة لها معدل إيجابي كاذب أقل بشكل ملحوظ في توليد المبررات. الكود الخاص بنا متاح مجانًا على https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés ont montré des performances exceptionnelles dans diverses tâches en aval. Mais cela se fait généralement au prix d'une latence et d'un calcul élevés, ce qui entrave leur utilisation dans des environnements aux ressources limitées. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une nouvelle approche pour réduire le coût de calcul du BERT avec une perte minimale de performances en aval. Notre méthode élimine dynamiquement les jetons moins contributifs à travers les couches, ce qui se traduit par des longueurs plus courtes et par conséquent des coûts de calcul inférieurs. Pour déterminer l'importance de chaque représentation de jeton, nous entraînons un prédicteur de contribution pour chaque couche à l'aide d'une méthode de saillance basée sur le gradient. Nos expériences sur différentes tâches de classification montrent des accélérations jusqu'à 22 fois pendant le temps d'inférence sans trop sacrifier les performances. Nous validons également la qualité des jetons sélectionnés dans notre méthode à l'aide d'annotations humaines dans le benchmark ERASER. Comparée à d'autres stratégies largement utilisées pour sélectionner des éléments importants, tels que la prépondérance et l'attention, notre méthode proposée présente un taux de faux positifs significativement plus faible pour générer des justifications. Notre code est disponible gratuitement sur https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados han demostrado un rendimiento estelar en varias tareas posteriores. Sin embargo, esto generalmente se produce a costa de una alta latencia y computación, lo que dificulta su uso en entornos con recursos limitados. En este trabajo, proponemos un enfoque novedoso para reducir el costo computacional de BERT con una pérdida mínima en el rendimiento descendente. Nuestro método elimina dinámicamente menos tokens contribuyentes a través de capas, lo que resulta en longitudes más cortas y, en consecuencia, menores costos computacionales. Para determinar la importancia de cada representación de token, entrenamos un predictor de contribución para cada capa utilizando un método de prominencia basado en degradado. Nuestros experimentos en varias tareas de clasificación diversas muestran aceleraciones de hasta 22 veces durante el tiempo de inferencia sin sacrificar demasiado el rendimiento. También validamos la calidad de los tokens seleccionados en nuestro método utilizando anotaciones humanas en el punto de referencia ERASER. En comparación con otras estrategias ampliamente utilizadas para seleccionar tokens importantes, como la prominencia y la atención, nuestro método propuesto tiene una tasa de falsos positivos significativamente más baja en la generación de justificaciones. Nuestro código está disponible gratuitamente en https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados mostraram desempenho estelar em várias tarefas downstream. Mas, isso geralmente vem ao custo de alta latência e computação, dificultando seu uso em configurações com recursos limitados. Neste trabalho, propomos uma nova abordagem para reduzir o custo computacional do BERT com perda mínima no desempenho downstream. Nosso método elimina dinamicamente tokens menos contribuintes através de camadas, resultando em comprimentos mais curtos e, consequentemente, menor custo computacional. Para determinar a importância de cada representação de token, treinamos um Preditor de Contribuição para cada camada usando um método de saliência baseado em gradiente. Nossos experimentos em diversas tarefas de classificação mostram acelerações de até 22x durante o tempo de inferência sem muito sacrifício no desempenho. Também validamos a qualidade dos tokens selecionados em nosso método usando anotações humanas no benchmark ERASER. Em comparação com outras estratégias amplamente utilizadas para selecionar tokens importantes, como saliência e atenção, nosso método proposto tem uma taxa de falsos positivos significativamente menor na geração de justificativas. Nosso código está disponível gratuitamente em https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングを受けた言語モデルは、さまざまな下流タスクで優れたパフォーマンスを示しています。 しかし、これは通常、高いレイテンシと計算のコストで発生し、リソースに制限された設定での使用を妨げます。 この研究では、下流性能の損失を最小限に抑えて、BERTの計算コストを削減するための新たなアプローチを提案します。 当社のメソッドは、レイヤーを介してより少ない寄与トークンを動的に排除し、長さを短くし、結果として計算コストを低減します。 各トークン表現の重要性を判断するために、グラデーションベースの突出度メソッドを使用して、各レイヤーの寄与度予測因子をトレーニングします。 いくつかの多様な分類タスクの実験では、パフォーマンスをあまり犠牲にすることなく、推論時間中に最大22倍のスピードアップが実証されています。 また、消しゴムベンチマークの人間による注釈を使用して、メソッドで選択したトークンの品質を検証します。 重要なトークンを選択するための他の広く使用されている戦略（顕著性や注意力など）と比較して、提案されている方法は、根拠を生成する際の偽陽性率が大幅に低くなります。 コードはhttps://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeRから無料でご利用いただけます。', 'zh': '先训之言,形于下流。 然常以迟速为价,阻其资受限之用。 此一新法,以减BERT计算成本,而损下流为最下。 吾法以动消其少令牌,以缩其长,以损其计算成本。 所以定令牌之大要,梯度显著性之法,各练其器。 异务之实验,倍于理22,而不为牺牲。 又于 ERASER 准试中用人工注验法中所选令牌质量。 比诸博用者,择要代币之策(如显著性与注意)相比,则吾道成基本原理者误报率显而降之。 吾代码可得于 https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR 免费。', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल ने विभिन्न डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों में तारकीय प्रदर्शन दिखाया है। लेकिन, यह आमतौर पर उच्च विलंबता और गणना की कीमत पर आता है, संसाधन-सीमित सेटिंग्स में उनके उपयोग में बाधा डालता है। इस काम में, हम डाउनस्ट्रीम प्रदर्शन में न्यूनतम नुकसान के साथ BERT की कम्प्यूटेशनल लागत को कम करने के लिए एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि गतिशील रूप से परतों के माध्यम से कम योगदान टोकन को समाप्त करती है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप कम लंबाई और परिणामस्वरूप कम कम्प्यूटेशनल लागत होती है। प्रत्येक टोकन प्रतिनिधित्व के महत्व को निर्धारित करने के लिए, हम ग्रेडिएंट-आधारित सैलिएंसी विधि का उपयोग करके प्रत्येक परत के लिए एक योगदान भविष्यवक्ता को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। कई विविध वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर हमारे प्रयोगप्रदर्शन में बहुत अधिक बलिदान के बिना अनुमान समय के दौरान 22x तक की गति दिखाते हैं। हम ERASER बेंचमार्क में मानव एनोटेशन का उपयोग करके हमारी विधि में चयनित टोकन की गुणवत्ता को भी मान्य करते हैं। महत्वपूर्ण टोकन का चयन करने के लिए अन्य व्यापक रूप से उपयोग की जाने वाली रणनीतियों की तुलना में, जैसे कि सैलिएंसी और ध्यान, हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि में तर्क उत्पन्न करने में काफी कम झूठी सकारात्मक दर है। हमारा कोड स्वतंत्र रूप से https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные языковые модели показали потрясающую производительность в различных последующих задачах. Но это обычно происходит за счет высокой задержки и вычислений, что препятствует их использованию в условиях ограниченности ресурсов. В этой работе мы предлагаем новый подход к снижению вычислительной стоимости BERT с минимальными потерями в производительности ниже по потоку. Наш метод динамически исключает меньшее количество токенов, вносящих свой вклад через слои, что приводит к сокращению длины и, следовательно, более низкой вычислительной стоимости. Чтобы определить важность каждого представления токена, мы обучаем Прогноз вклада для каждого слоя с использованием метода солености на основе градиента. Наши эксперименты по нескольким разнообразным задачам классификации показывают ускорения до 22 раз за время вывода без особых жертв в производительности. Мы также проверяем качество выбранных токенов в нашем методе, используя человеческие аннотации в ЛАСТИКЕ. По сравнению с другими широко используемыми стратегиями для выбора важных токенов, таких как соленость и внимание, предлагаемый нами метод имеет значительно более низкий показатель ложноположительных результатов в генерировании обоснований. Наш код свободно доступен по адресу https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ga': 'Tá feidhmíocht réchúiseach léirithe ag samhlacha teanga réamhoilte i dtascanna éagsúla iartheachtacha. Ach, is gnách go dtagann sé seo ar chostas ard fhola agus ríomh, rud a chuireann bac ar a n-úsáid i suíomhanna teoranta ó thaobh acmhainní de. San obair seo, molaimid cur chuige nua chun costas ríomhaireacht BERT a laghdú le caillteanas íosta i bhfeidhmíocht iartheachtacha. Cuireann ár modh deireadh go dinimiciúil le níos lú comharthaí ranníocaíochta trí chisil, rud a fhágann go mbíonn faid níos giorra agus costas ríomhaireachta níos ísle dá bharr. Chun an tábhacht a bhaineann le gach léiriú ar chomharthaí a chinneadh, déanaimid oiliúint ar Réamhaithriseoir Ranníocaíochta do gach ciseal ag baint úsáide as modh sábháltachta atá bunaithe ar ghrádán. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar roinnt tascanna aicmithe éagsúla luasanna suas le 22 uair le linn am tátal gan mórán íobairt feidhmíochta. Déanaimid bailíochtú freisin ar cháilíocht na ndearbhuithe roghnaithe inár modh trí úsáid a bhaint as nótaí daonna i dtagarmharc ERASER. I gcomparáid le straitéisí eile a úsáidtear go forleathan chun comharthaí tábhachtacha a roghnú, cosúil le hiontaofacht agus aird, tá ráta dearfach bréagach i bhfad níos ísle ag ár modh molta maidir le réasúnaíocht a ghiniúint. Tá ár gcód ar fáil saor in aisce ag https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'el': 'Τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα έχουν δείξει εξαιρετική απόδοση σε διάφορες μεταγενέστερες εργασίες. Αλλά, αυτό συνήθως έρχεται με κόστος της υψηλής καθυστέρησης και του υπολογισμού, εμποδίζοντας τη χρήση τους σε ρυθμίσεις περιορισμένων πόρων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση για τη μείωση του υπολογιστικού κόστους του με ελάχιστη απώλεια στις μεταγενέστερες επιδόσεις. Η μέθοδος μας εξαλείφει δυναμικά λιγότερο συνεισφέροντα σήματα μέσω στρωμάτων, με αποτέλεσμα μικρότερα μήκη και κατά συνέπεια χαμηλότερο υπολογιστικό κόστος. Για να προσδιορίσουμε τη σημασία κάθε συμβολικής αναπαράστασης, εκπαιδεύουμε έναν Προβλεπόμενο Συμβολής για κάθε στρώμα χρησιμοποιώντας μια μέθοδο διαφάνειας βασισμένη σε διαβάθμιση. Τα πειράματά μας σε διάφορες διαφορετικές εργασίες ταξινόμησης δείχνουν επιτάχυνση έως 22κατά τη διάρκεια του χρόνου συμπερασμάτων χωρίς μεγάλη θυσία στην απόδοση. Επίσης επικυρώνουμε την ποιότητα των επιλεγμένων σημάτων στη μέθοδο μας χρησιμοποιώντας ανθρώπινα σχόλια στο σημείο αναφοράς. Σε σύγκριση με άλλες ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενες στρατηγικές για την επιλογή σημαντικών σημάτων, όπως η ευδιάκριτη και η προσοχή, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μας έχει ένα σημαντικά χαμηλότερο ψευδώς θετικό ποσοστό στη δημιουργία αιτιολογιών. Ο κωδικός μας είναι ελεύθερος διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'hu': 'Az előképzett nyelvi modellek csillagos teljesítményt mutattak különböző downstream feladatokban. Ez azonban általában nagy késleltetés és számítás árán jár, ami akadályozza azok használatát erőforrás-korlátozott beállításokban. Ebben a munkában új megközelítést javasolunk a BERT számítási költségeinek csökkentésére, minimális downstream teljesítményvesztéssel. Módszerünk dinamikusan kiküszöböli a kevesebb hozzájáruló tokeneket a rétegeken keresztül, ami rövidebb hosszúságot és ennek következtében alacsonyabb számítási költséget eredményez. Az egyes tokenreprezentációk fontosságának meghatározásához minden egyes réteghez egy hozzájárulási előrejelzőt képzünk átmenet alapú kiemelkedési módszerrel. Számos különböző osztályozási feladaton végzett kísérleteink a következtetési idő alatt akár 22x-es gyorsulást mutatnak anélkül, hogy sok áldozatot hoznának a teljesítményben. A kiválasztott tokenek minőségét is érvényesítjük módszerünkben az ERASER referenciaértékben szereplő emberi megjegyzésekkel. A fontos tokenek kiválasztására szolgáló más, széles körben használt stratégiákkal összehasonlítva, mint például a nyálas és figyelem, javasolt módszerünk jelentősen alacsonyabb a hamis pozitív aránnyal rendelkezik az indokok generálásában. A kódunk ingyenesen elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ka': 'პირველი განსწავლებული ენის მოდელები განსხვავებული დავალებში ჩვენებენ ვარსკვლავ მუშაობა. მაგრამ, ეს საერთოდ უფრო დიდი სინამდვილეობის და კომპუტაციის შესაძლებლობად მოხდება, რომელიც მათი გამოყენება რესურსების შესაძლებელად დასაწყებ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ პრომენტის პროგორმაცია BERT-ის კომპუტაციალური ღირებულების შემცირებისთვის მინიმალური დაკავშირებაში. ჩვენი პროცემი დინამიკურად გამოყენებს უფრო მეტად დამატებული სიგრძე, რომელიც შეიძლება კიდევ მეტად სიგრძე და შემდეგ უფრო მეტად კომპუტაციული რომელიც ყოველ მონიშვნების გასანიშვნელობის განსაზღვრება, ჩვენ ყველა მონიშვნელობის მონიშვნელობის პრედიქტორის განვიყავით, რომელიც განვიყავით გრადენტიური პრედი ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები რამდენიმე განსხვავებული კლასიფიკაციის საქმედებში გამოჩვენება სწრაფად 22x დროს განსხვავებული დროში, უფრო დიდი ზრდაპირება გამოცდილებ ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ მონიშნული სიმბოლოების გასაწყისას ჩვენი მეტიდან ადამიანის ანოტაციების გამოყენებას ERASER ბენქმარკში. სხვა საშუალოდ გამოყენებული სტრატიგიების შეცდომაში გასანიშნავი სტრატიგიების შეცდომა, როგორც სტალიცია და გონიშნობა, ჩვენი მიზეზებული მეთოდის შეცდომად უფრო ცო ჩვენი კოდი თავისუფალურად ხელხილდება https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'it': "Modelli linguistici pre-addestrati hanno mostrato prestazioni stellari in varie attività a valle. Ma, di solito, questo avviene a costo di alta latenza e calcolo, ostacolando il loro utilizzo in impostazioni limitate alle risorse. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo approccio per ridurre il costo computazionale di BERT con perdite minime nelle prestazioni a valle. Il nostro metodo elimina dinamicamente meno token contributivi attraverso i livelli, con conseguente riduzione delle lunghezze e di conseguenza dei costi computazionali. Per determinare l'importanza di ogni rappresentazione di token, addestriamo un Predictor di Contributo per ogni livello utilizzando un metodo di salienza basato su gradiente. I nostri esperimenti su diverse attività di classificazione mostrano velocità fino a 22x durante il tempo di inferenza senza molti sacrifici nelle prestazioni. Validiamo anche la qualità dei token selezionati nel nostro metodo utilizzando annotazioni umane nel benchmark ERASER. Rispetto ad altre strategie ampiamente utilizzate per la selezione di token importanti, come salienza e attenzione, il nostro metodo proposto ha un tasso significativamente più basso di falsi positivi nella generazione di motivazioni. Il nostro codice è liberamente disponibile a https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai parodė žvaigždinį veiksmingumą įvairiose tolesnėse užduotyse. Tačiau tai paprastai atsiranda dėl didelio vėlavimo ir skaičiavimo sąnaudų, trukdančių jų naudojimui ribotuose ištekliuose. In this work, we propose a novel approach for reducing the computational cost of BERT with minimal loss in downstream performance.  Mūsų metodas dinamiškai pašalina mažiau prisidedančius ženklus per sluoksnius, dėl to atsiranda trumpesnis ilgis ir dėl to mažesnės skaičiavimo sąnaudos. Siekiant nustatyti kiekvieno ženklo atspaudimo svarbą, mes mokome kiekvieno sluoksnio įnašo predictorių naudojant gradientu pagrįstą druskos metodą. Mūsų eksperimentai dėl kelių skirtingų klasifikavimo užduočių rodo greitį iki 22 kartų per išvados laikotarpį be didelių aukų atlikimo. Taip pat patvirtiname pasirinktų ženklų kokybę savo metode naudojant žmogiškąsias anotacijas ERASER lyginamojoje dalyje. Palyginti su kitomis plačiai naudojamomis svarbių ženklų atrankos strategijomis, pavyzdžiui, druskos ir dėmesio, mūsų siūlomas metodas turi gerokai mažesnį klaidingą teigiamą lygį sukuriant racionalų. Mūsų kodas laisvai prieinamas https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'mk': 'Претренираните јазички модели покажаа ѕвездена резултат во различни задачи на потекло. Но, ова обично доаѓа по цена на висока тајност и компјутација, што ги попречува нивните употреби во поставувања со ограничени ресурси. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нов пристап за намалување на пресметувачките трошоци на БЕРТ со минимална загуба во последните резултати. Нашиот метод динамично елиминира помалку придонесувачки симболи преку слоеви, резултирајќи со помали должини и со тоа пониски пресметувачки трошоци. За да ја одредиме важноста на секоја претстава на знаците, тренираме предвидувач на придонес за секој слој користејќи метод на солитност базиран на градиент. Нашите експерименти на неколку различни класификациски задачи покажуваат брзини до 22 пати за време на инференцијата без многу жртвување во изведбата. Ние, исто така, го валидираме квалитетот на избраните знаци во нашиот метод користејќи човечки анотации во benchmark ЕРАСЕР. Во споредба со другите широко употребени стратегии за избор на важни знаци, како што се слината и вниманието, нашиот предложен метод има значително пониска лажна позитивна стапка во генерирањето рационални причини. Нашиот код е слободно достапен на https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'kk': 'Алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілері жұлдыз істеуін түрлі төменгі тапсырмаларда көрсетті. Бірақ бұл кәдімгі ресурстардың шектелген параметрлерінде қолдануға көмектеседі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз BERT компьютерлік бағаттарын төмендету үшін романдық тәсілді ұсынамыз. Біздің әдіміміз динамикалық қабаттар арқылы көмектесетін белгілерді өшіріп, қысқа ұзындығын және сол үшін есептеу бағаларын азайтады. Әрбір белгілердің маңыздылығын анықтау үшін, біз әрбір қабат үшін қатынау предикторын градиенттің негізінде салаулық тәсілі арқылы үйренеміз. Біздің бірнеше түрлі классификациялық тапсырмалардың тәжірибелеріміз көп жұмыс істеу уақытында 22x көп жылдамдығын көрсетеді. Біз сондай-ақ ERASER белгісінде адамдардың белгілерін қолдану арқылы таңдалған белгілердің сапатын тексереміз. Басқа қолданылған стратегиялармен салыстырып, маңызды белгілерді таңдау үшін, мысалы, салыстық және назардық тәртібіміздің ұсынылған тәртібіміздің рационалияларды құру үшін дұрыс Біздің кодмыз жеткізілген https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa terlatih-awal telah menunjukkan prestasi bintang dalam berbagai tugas turun. Tetapi, ini biasanya datang dengan biaya ketinggalan tinggi dan pengiraan, menghalangi penggunaan mereka dalam tetapan yang terbatas sumber. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan baru untuk mengurangi biaya pengiraan BERT dengan kerugian minimal dalam prestasi turun. Kaedah kita secara dinamik menghapuskan token yang kurang berkontribusi melalui lapisan, yang menghasilkan panjang yang lebih pendek dan sebagainya biaya pengiraan yang lebih rendah. Untuk menentukan kepentingan setiap perwakilan token, kita melatih Prediktor Kontribusi untuk setiap lapisan menggunakan kaedah salinsi berdasarkan gradien. Eksperimen kami pada beberapa tugas klasifikasi berbeza menunjukkan kecepatan hingga 22x selama masa kesimpulan tanpa banyak pengorbanan dalam prestasi. Kami juga sahkan kualiti token terpilih dalam kaedah kami menggunakan anotasi manusia dalam tanda referensi ERASER. Berbanding dengan strategi lain yang digunakan secara luas untuk memilih token penting, seperti saliency dan perhatian, kaedah kami diusulkan mempunyai kadar positif palsu yang jauh lebih rendah dalam menghasilkan rasional. Kod kita tersedia dengan bebas di https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീമങ്ങളില്\u200d സ്റ്റെല്റര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം കാണിച്ചിരിക് പക്ഷെ, ഇത് സാധാരണയായി ഉയര്\u200dന്ന ലേറ്റെന്റിയും കണക്ക് ചെലവും വരുന്നു. വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ പരിധികളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് തടഞ്ഞു. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ കണക്കിട വില കുറച്ച് കൂടുതല്\u200d നഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പ്രായോഗ്രാം  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്ന അടയാളങ്ങളിലൂടെ ചെലവഴിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറച്ച് നീളം കുറച്ച് കൂടി ക ഓരോ അടയാളം പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഗ്രേഡിയന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സാധാരണ രീതിയി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യവസ്ഥകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d അധികം ബലിയര്\u200dപ്പിക്കാത നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട അടയാളങ്ങളുടെ ഗുണത്തെയും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി മറ്റു വിശാലമായ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ട ട്രാക്ടിജിറ്ററികളോട് തിര നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് സ്വതന്ത്ര്യമായി ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'mt': 'Mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel urew prestazzjoni stellari f’diversi kompiti downstream. Iżda, dan normalment iseħħ bi spiża ta’ latenza għolja u komputazzjoni, li jfixklu l-użu tagħhom f’ambjenti limitati għar-riżorsi. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu approċċ ġdid għat-tnaqqis tal-ispiża komputattiva tal-BERT b’telf minimu fil-prestazzjoni downstream. Il-metodu tagħna jelimina b’mod dinamiku tokens li jikkontribwixxu inqas permezz ta’ saffi, li jirriżultaw f’tul iqsar u konsegwentement fi spiża komputattiva aktar baxxa. Biex niddeterminaw l-importanza ta’ kull rappreżentazzjoni ta’ token, a ħna nħarrġu Predikatur tal-Kontribuzzjoni għal kull saff bl-użu ta’ metodu ta’ salinċja bbażat fuq gradjenti. L-esperimenti tagħna fuq diversi kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni varji juru veloċitajiet sa 22x matul iż-żmien ta’ inferenza mingħajr ħafna sacrifiċċju fil-prestazzjoni. Nivvalidaw ukoll il-kwalità tat-tokens magħżula fil-metodu tagħna bl-użu ta’ annotazzjonijiet umani fil-punt ta’ riferiment ERASER. Meta mqabbel ma’ strateġiji oħra użati b’mod wiesa’ għall-għa żla ta’ tokens importanti, bħas-salinċja u l-attenzjoni, il-metodu propost tagħna għandu rata pożittiva foloz ferm aktar baxxa fil-ġenerazzjoni ta’ raġunijiet. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli b’mod ħieles fuq https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварууд олон доорх үйл ажиллагаанд оддын үйл ажиллагааг харуулсан. Гэхдээ энэ нь ихэвчлэн маш өндөр сүүлийн болон тооцоололтын үнэтэй болдог. Байгаль хязгаарлагдсан нөхцөлд ашиглахыг зогсоож байна. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид BERT-ийн тооцоололтын үнэ багасгах шинэ арга зам санал болгож байна. Бидний арга нь динамик хэмжээгээр бага нөлөөлөх тодорхойлолтуудыг устгаж, богино урт болон тооны зардал багасгаж байна. Загвар бүрийн тодорхойлолтын чухал зүйлийг тодорхойлохын тулд бид давхар бүрийн тодорхойлолтын тулд градиент дээр суурилсан цэвэрлэлтийн аргыг ашиглаж зориулдаг. Бидний олон төрлийн ангилалын даалгаварын туршилтууд үргэлжлүүлэх цаг хугацаанд 22x хүртэл хурдыг харуулдаг. Мөн бид эрАСЕР багц дээр хүний нэр тодорхойлолтыг ашиглан сонгогдсон тодорхойлолтуудын сайн чанарыг баталж байна. Мөн чухал тодорхойлолтуудыг сонгохын тулд бусад шинжлэх хэрэглэгдсэн стратегийг харьцуулахад бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь ойлголтыг бий болгохын тулд үнэхээр бага эерэг тодорхойлолтой. Бидний код үнэгүй https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'no': 'Førehandsvis språk- modeller har vist stjernende utviklingar i ulike nedstrekkoppgåver. Men dette kjem vanlegvis på kostnad for høg latens og rekningar, som hindrar bruken av ressursbegrenset innstillingar. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein novel tilnærming for å redusera databasekostnaden til BERT med minimalt tap i nedstremd utvikling. Metoden vårt blir dynamisk eliminert mindre bidra til teikn gjennom lag, som fører til korte lengde og derfor lavere datakostnader. For å bestemme viktigheten for kvar representasjon av teikn, treng vi ein tilbudsreduktor for kvar lag med ein fargeovergangsbasert saliensmetode. Eksperimentane våre på fleire forskjellige klassifikasjonsprogrammer viser raskaren opp til 22x under infeksjonstid utan mykje ofte i utviklinga. Vi kontrollerer også kvaliteten på dei valde teikna i metoden vårt med menneske notasjonar i ERASER-benchmarket. I sammenligning med andre breidde brukte strategiar for å velja viktige teikn, som salisitet og oppmerksomhet, har vårt foreslått metode ein betydelig mindre falsk positiv rate i å laga rasjonar. Koden vårt er fritt tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe wykazały doskonałą wydajność w różnych dalszych zadaniach. Ale zwykle jest to kosztem dużych opóźnień i obliczeń, utrudniając ich wykorzystanie w ustawieniach ograniczonych zasobami. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowatorskie podejście do zmniejszenia kosztów obliczeniowych BERT przy minimalnych stratach wydajności dalszego szczebla. Nasza metoda dynamicznie eliminuje mniej przyczyniające się tokeny przez warstwy, co powoduje krótsze długości i w konsekwencji niższe koszty obliczeniowe. Aby określić znaczenie każdej reprezentacji tokenów, trenujemy predyktor wkładu dla każdej warstwy przy użyciu metody wyśmienitej opartej na gradientach. Nasze eksperymenty nad kilkoma różnymi zadaniami klasyfikacji pokazują przyspieszenie do 22x w czasie wnioskowania bez większych poświęceń w wydajności. Weryfikujemy również jakość wybranych tokenów w naszej metodzie za pomocą adnotacji ludzkich w referencji ERASER. W porównaniu do innych szeroko stosowanych strategii wyboru ważnych tokenów, takich jak wyraźność i uwaga, proponowana metoda ma znacznie niższy wskaźnik fałszywie dodatnich w generowaniu uzasadnień. Nasz kod jest darmowo dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite au arătat performanțe stelare în diferite sarcini din aval. Dar, acest lucru vine de obicei cu costul unei latențe ridicate și calcule, împiedicând utilizarea lor în setări limitate de resurse. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare nouă pentru reducerea costului computațional al BERT cu pierderi minime în performanța din aval. Metoda noastră elimină dinamic mai puține jetoane contributive prin straturi, rezultând lungimi mai scurte și, prin urmare, costuri de calcul mai mici. Pentru a determina importanța fiecărei reprezentări de token, instruim un predictor de contribuție pentru fiecare strat folosind o metodă de saliență bazată pe gradient. Experimentele noastre pe mai multe sarcini de clasificare diverse arată viteze de până la 22x în timpul inferenței, fără multe sacrificii în performanță. Validăm, de asemenea, calitatea jetoanelor selectate în metoda noastră folosind adnotări umane în benchmark ERASER. În comparație cu alte strategii utilizate pe scară largă pentru selectarea jetoanelor importante, cum ar fi saliența și atenția, metoda noastră propusă are o rată semnificativ mai mică de fals pozitiv în generarea rațiunilor. Codul nostru este disponibil gratuit la https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'sr': 'Pre-obučeni jezički modeli pokazali su zvijezde izvršnost u raznim poslovima. Ali, ovo obično dolazi na troškove visoke latencije i računala, sprječavajući njihovu upotrebu u ograničenim nastavama resursa. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi pristup za smanjenje računalnih troškova BERT-a sa minimalnim gubitkom snimka. Naša metoda dinamički eliminiše manje doprinosi znakovima kroz slojeve, što je rezultiralo kraćom dužinom i stoga manjim računalnim troškovima. Da bismo utvrdili važnost svakog predstavljanja znakova, trenirali smo predstavnika pridruživanja za svaki sloj koristeći metodu salitete na osnovu gradient a. Naši eksperimenti na nekoliko različitih klasifikacijskih zadataka pokazuju brzinu do 22x tokom inficiranja vremena bez mnogo žrtve u izvedbi. Takođe potvrđujemo kvalitet odabranih znakova u našoj metodi koristeći ljudske annotacije u ERASER benchmarku. U usporedbi sa drugim široko korištenim strategijama za biranje važnih znakova, poput salicije i pažnje, naš predloženi metod ima značajno manju lažnu pozitivnu stopu u stvaranju racionala. Naš kod je slobodno dostupan. https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් විවිධ වැඩක් වල ස්ට්\u200dරේටර් වැඩක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත්, මේක සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය සහ ගණනාකරණය ගැන විශේෂයෙන් එනවා, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම් මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා BERT ගේ පණිවිඩය ගැන අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම අඩුම නැති වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපේ විද්\u200dයාව විද්\u200dයාමික විද්\u200dයාමයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් අඩුම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන හැම තොකෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයේ වැදගත්වය නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න, අපි හැම තොක්කෙන්ම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක්ම ග්\u200dරේඩියාන්ඩ්  අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විවිධ විවිධ විශේෂ කාර්යවල් වලින් විවිධ විශේෂ කාර්යවල් පෙන්වන්නේ 22x වෙලාවට වේග අපි තෝරාගෙන තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය අපේ විදියට මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් භාවිත කරනවා ERASER බෙන්ච්මාර්ක වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරාගන්න අනිත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාපයක් සම අපේ කේතය නිදහස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'so': 'Tusaalada afka hore oo la tababaray waxaa lagu muujiyey sameynta galmada shaqooyin kala duduwan. Laakiin taasi inta badan waxay ka timaadaa kharashka dhaqdhaqaalaha iyo xisaabinta sare, waxayna ka hor marsataa isticmaalkooda meelaha ay haystaan. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab warqad ah oo aan hoos u dhigno kharashka xisaabta ee BERT iyo khasaarada ugu yaraan dhamaadka sameynta biyaha hoose. Dhaqdhaqaalkayaga ayaa si hoos ah u dejinaya calaamado ka yar oo ku saabsan qasnadaha, taasoo sababto ah dhaadheer gaaban iyo kharashka xisaabinta ka hoosaysa. Si aan u caddeyno muhiimka u ah muuqashada calaamad kasta, waxaynu u tababarinnaa qalabka lacagta ku saabsan heer kasta, si aan u isticmaalno qaab qiimo ah. Imtixaankayada shaqada kala duduwan waxay muuqataa waqtiga cudurka ah oo aan allabari badaneyn. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku xaqiijinnaa qiimaha calaamadaha la doortay qaababkayaga ee lagu isticmaalayo baaritaanka dadka ee ERASER. Isbarbardhig oo u dhigi karo qalabka kale oo ballaadhan oo loo doorto calaamado muhiim ah, tusaale ahaan badbaadada iyo daryeelka, qaababkayaga la soo jeeday waxay leedahay mid aad u hoosaysa qiimaha beenta ah oo ku saabsan koritaanka farsamada. Our code is freely available at  https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'sv': 'Förutbildade språkmodeller har visat enastående prestanda i olika nedströmsuppgifter. Men detta kommer vanligtvis på bekostnad av hög fördröjning och beräkning, vilket hindrar deras användning i resursbegränsade inställningar. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt för att minska beräkningskostnaderna för BERT med minimal förlust av prestanda nedströms. Vår metod eliminerar dynamiskt mindre bidragande tokens genom lager, vilket resulterar i kortare längder och därmed lägre beräkningskostnader. För att fastställa betydelsen av varje token representation tränar vi en bidragsförutsägare för varje lager med hjälp av en gradientbaserad saliency-metod. Våra experiment på flera olika klassificeringsuppgifter visar upp till 22x snabbare under inferenstiden utan större uppoffringar i prestanda. Vi validerar också kvaliteten på de valda tokenerna i vår metod med hjälp av mänskliga anteckningar i ERASER-riktmärket. Jämfört med andra allmänt använda strategier för att välja viktiga tokens, såsom saliens och uppmärksamhet, har vår föreslagna metod en betydligt lägre falsk positiv frekvens när det gäller att generera rationaler. Vår kod är fritt tillgänglig på https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ta': 'முன்பு பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகள் செயல்பாட்டை காண்பித்துள்ளார்கள் ஆனால், இது வழக்கமாக அதிக அலங்காரத்தின் மற்றும் கணக்கிட விலையில் வருகிறது, மூலத்தின் வரம்பு அமைப்புகளில் பயன்பாட்டை தடுக In this work, we propose a novel approach for reducing the computational cost of BERT with minimal loss in downstream performance.  அடுக்குகள் மூலம் குறைந்த குறைவான குறியீடுகளை நீக்குகிறது, குறைந்த நீளம் மற்றும் அதனால் கணக்கிட விலை குறைந்தது. ஒவ்வொரு குறியீடு குறியீட்டின் முக்கியத்தை தீர்மானிக்க, நாம் ஒவ்வொரு அடுக்கும் பங்கீடு முன்னிருப்பாக பயிற்ச பல்வேறு வகுப்பு பணிகளில் நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் செய்யும் போது நோய் நேரத்தில் மிகவும் வேகத்தைக் காண்பிக்கிறது முடி நாம் ERASER பென்க்மேக்கில் மனித அறிவிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட குறியீடுகளின் தரம் சரிபார்க் முக்கியமான குறியீடுகளை தேர்வு செய்ய வேண்டிய மற்றும் கவனத்தை ஒப்பிடுவதில், எங்கள் பரிந்துரைய முறையில் பொய் நேர்ந்த விகிதத்தை உருவ எங்கள் குறியீடு இலவசமாக இருக்கிறது https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ur': 'پہلے تدریس کی زبان موڈل نے طرح طرح کے نیچے کاموں میں ستاروں کی فعالیت دکھائی ہے. لیکن یہ معمولا بالا لاٹنسیٹ اور کمپیوٹ کے قیمت پر آتا ہے، جو ان کے استعمال کو منع کرتی ہے، اس کے ذریعہ سے محدود ہے. اس کام میں ہم نے BERT کی کمپیوٹریشن قیمت کاٹنے کے لئے ایک نئی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ کمترین خسارہ کے ساتھ کمترین خسارہ ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ ہدایت سے کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم کم ہر ٹوکنوں کی تعریف کا اہم مقرر کرنے کے لئے، ہم ہر طبقه کے لئے ایک حصہ پیشدیکتور کی تعریف کرتے ہیں، ایک گرڈینٹ بنیاد رکھنے والی سیلینستی طریقہ کے مطابق۔ ہماری آزمائش مختلف مختلف کلاسیفوں کے کاموں میں 22x تک پہنچ رہی ہے، فعالیت میں بہت زیادہ قربانی کے بغیر. ہم نے بھی اپنے طریقے میں انتخاب کئے ہوئے علائم کے گوارتہ کی تصدیق کرلیا ہے کہ انسان کے علائم کے استعمال کریں اور دوسرے مطابق استراتژیکوں کے مقابلہ میں اہم نشانیاں انتخاب کرنے کے لئے، جیسے سائل اور توجه، ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقے کے لئے بہت کم مطابق مثبت رات ہے۔ ہمارا کوڈ آزاد طور پر موجود ہے https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi tillar modellari turli taʼminlovchi vazifalar bilan ishlashni koʻrsatadi. Lekin, bu oddiy narsalarning o'zgarishlarini o'zgartiradi. Bu ishda, biz BERT'ning kompyuterning qiymatini kamaytirish uchun novel usulni o'ylaymiz. Lokal soʻzni bajarishda juda kichkina yoʻqolishi mumkin. Bizning usuli qatlamlar orqali qanchalik foydalanuvchi belgilarni olib tashlaydi. Ular uzunligi qisqa va keyin kompyuterning qiymatini kamaytirish qiymatini yaratadi. Har bir belgilarning muhimligini aniqlash uchun, biz har qatlamning qismini qo'shish usuli bilan bir darajaga qaramaymiz. Ko'pchilik tashkilotlarimizning ko'pchilik tashkilotlarimizni bajarish vaqtida tezlik paytidagi 22x ga tezlik ko'p harakat qiladi. Biz ERASER benchmark bilan inson taʼminlovchilarni ishlatish usulida tanlangan belgilar sifatini bajaramiz. Boshqa muhim belgilarni tanlash uchun katta ishlatilgan strategiyalarni kamaytirish mumkin, masalan soʻzlik va taqdim qilish mumkin, iloji qilingan usulning imkoniyatlarini yaratishda juda juda juda kichik qiziqdir. Kodlash qoidamiz https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'vi': 'Những mô- đun ngôn ngữ được huấn luyện đã thể hiện khả năng siêu việt trong các công việc xuôi dòng. Nhưng, điều này thường xảy ra với giá trị của việc ẩn náu và tính toán cao, cản trở sử dụng chúng trong thiết lập hạn chế tài nguyên. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để giảm chi phí tính toán của BERT với giảm tối thiểu các hiệu suất xuôi dòng. Cách của ta điều khiển bọn dấu tiếp nhất qua lỗ giấy, khiến ta có thể kiếm được cái bước ngắn hơn và tất cả cả chi phí phát. Để xác định tầm quan trọng của mỗi biểu tượng tượng, chúng tôi đào tạo một yếu tố dự đoán cho mỗi lớp bằng một phương pháp chứa độ cao. Những thí nghiệm về các công việc phân loại khác nhau cho thấy tốc độ lên 22x trong suốt thời gian suy đoán không có nhiều hy sinh trong hoạt động. Chúng tôi cũng xác nhận chất lượng của những thẻ đã chọn trong phương pháp sử dụng chú thích con người trong tiêu chuẩn Phim Phim định. So với các chiến lược đã được sử dụng rộng khác để lựa chọn những vật chứng quan trọng, ví dụ như sự nổi tiếng và chú ý, phương pháp của chúng ta có tỷ lệ sai lệch đáng kể trong việc tạo ra lý trí. Mật mã của chúng ta có thể dùng tại https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените езикови модели показват отлична производителност при различни задачи надолу по веригата. Но това обикновено идва с цената на висока латентност и изчисление, което пречи на използването им в ограничени ресурси настройки. В тази работа предлагаме нов подход за намаляване на изчислителните разходи на БЕРТ с минимална загуба на производителност надолу по веригата. Нашият метод динамично елиминира по-малко токени чрез слоеве, което води до по-къси дължини и следователно по-ниски изчислителни разходи. За да определим значението на всяко символно представяне, ние обучаваме предсказател за принос за всеки слой, използвайки градиент-базиран метод на видимост. Нашите експерименти с няколко различни задачи за класификация показват ускорения до 22х по време на заключение без много жертви в производителността. Ние също така валидираме качеството на избраните токени в нашия метод, като използваме човешки анотации в бенчмарка. В сравнение с други широко използвани стратегии за избор на важни символи, като видимост и внимание, нашият предложен метод има значително по-нисък процент на фалшиви позитивни при генерирането на обосновки. Нашият код е свободен на адрес: https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide taalmodellen hebben uitstekende prestaties getoond in verschillende downstreamtaken. Maar dit gaat meestal ten koste van hoge latentie en berekening, waardoor het gebruik ervan in resourcebeperkte instellingen wordt belemmerd. In dit werk stellen we een nieuwe aanpak voor voor het verlagen van de rekenkosten van BERT met minimaal verlies in downstream prestaties. Onze methode elimineert dynamisch minder bijdragende tokens door lagen, wat resulteert in kortere lengtes en bijgevolg lagere rekenkosten. Om het belang van elke tokenrepresentatie te bepalen, trainen we voor elke laag een Contribution Predictor met behulp van een gradiënt-gebaseerde saliciteitsmethode. Onze experimenten met verschillende classificatietaken tonen snellere snelheden tot 22x tijdens inferentietijd zonder veel verlies aan prestaties. We valideren ook de kwaliteit van de geselecteerde tokens in onze methode met behulp van menselijke annotaties in de ERASER benchmark. In vergelijking met andere veel gebruikte strategieën voor het selecteren van belangrijke tokens, zoals opvallendheid en aandacht, heeft onze voorgestelde methode een significant lager vals positief percentage in het genereren van rationales. Onze code is gratis beschikbaar op https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'da': 'Forududdannede sprogmodeller har vist stjerne ydeevne i forskellige downstream opgaver. Men dette kommer normalt på bekostning af høj ventetid og beregning, hvilket hindrer deres brug i ressourcebegrænsede indstillinger. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny tilgang til at reducere beregningsomkostningerne ved BERT med minimalt tab i downstream ydeevne. Vores metode eliminerer dynamisk mindre bidragende tokens gennem lag, hvilket resulterer i kortere længder og dermed lavere beregningsomkostninger. For at bestemme vigtigheden af hver token repræsentation træner vi en bidragsforudsiger for hvert lag ved hjælp af en gradient-baseret fremhævelsesmetode. Vores eksperimenter med flere forskellige klassificeringsopgaver viser hastigheder op til 22x i inference tid uden meget ofre i ydeevnen. Vi validerer også kvaliteten af de valgte tokens i vores metode ved hjælp af menneskelige annotationer i ERASER benchmark. Sammenlignet med andre almindeligt anvendte strategier til udvælgelse af vigtige tokens, såsom salience og opmærksomhed, har vores foreslåede metode en betydeligt lavere falsk positiv rate i at generere rationaler. Vores kode er frit tilgængelig på https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte Sprachmodelle haben hervorragende Leistungen in verschiedenen nachgelagerten Aufgaben gezeigt. Dies geht jedoch in der Regel mit hohen Latenzen und Berechnungen einher, was deren Nutzung in ressourcenbeschränkten Umgebungen erschwert. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen neuartigen Ansatz vor, um die Rechenkosten von BERT bei minimalem Verlust der nachgeschalteten Leistung zu reduzieren. Unsere Methode eliminiert dynamisch weniger beitragende Token durch Schichten, was zu kürzeren Längen und folglich geringeren Rechenkosten führt. Um die Bedeutung jeder Token-Darstellung zu bestimmen, trainieren wir für jede Ebene einen Contribution Predictor mithilfe einer gradientenbasierten Saliency-Methode. Unsere Experimente an verschiedenen Klassifizierungsaufgaben zeigen Beschleunigungen bis zu 22x während der Inferenzzeit ohne große Leistungseinbußen. Wir validieren auch die Qualität der ausgewählten Token in unserer Methode mit menschlichen Anmerkungen im ERASER Benchmark. Im Vergleich zu anderen weit verbreiteten Strategien zur Auswahl wichtiger Token, wie Saliency und Aufmerksamkeit, hat unsere vorgeschlagene Methode eine signifikant niedrigere falsch positive Rate bei der Generierung von Gründen. Unser Code ist frei verfügbar unter https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'id': 'Model bahasa terlatih telah menunjukkan prestasi bintang dalam berbagai tugas turun. Tapi, ini biasanya datang dengan biaya tertunda tinggi dan komputasi, menghalangi penggunaan mereka dalam pengaturan yang terbatas sumber daya. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan baru untuk mengurangi biaya komputasi BERT dengan kehilangan minimal dalam prestasi turun. Metode kita secara dinamik menghapuskan token yang kurang berkontribusi melalui lapisan, yang menyebabkan panjang pendek dan konsekuensinya biaya komputasi yang lebih rendah. Untuk menentukan pentingnya setiap perwakilan token, kita melatih Prediktor Kontribusi untuk setiap lapisan menggunakan metode salinsi berdasarkan gradien. Eksperimen kami pada beberapa tugas klasifikasi berbeda menunjukkan kecepatan hingga 22x selama waktu kesimpulan tanpa banyak pengorbanan dalam pertunjukan. Kami juga mengkvalifikasi kualitas token yang dipilih dalam metode kami menggunakan anotasi manusia dalam benchmark ERASER. Dalam perbandingan dengan strategi lainnya yang sangat digunakan untuk memilih token penting, seperti salinsi dan perhatian, metode kami diusulkan memiliki tingkat positif palsu yang jauh lebih rendah dalam menghasilkan rasional. Kode kita tersedia dengan bebas di https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'hr': 'Prije obučenih jezičkih modela pokazala su zvijezdane učinke u raznim zadatkima. Ali to obično dolazi na troškove visoke latencije i računala, sprječavajući njihovu uporabu u ograničenim nastavama resursa. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi pristup smanjenju računalnih troškova BERT-a s minimalnim gubitkom u iznosu učinka. Naša metoda dinamički eliminira manje doprinošće znakove kroz slojeve, što je rezultiralo kraćom dužinom i stoga manjim računalnim troškovima. Da bismo utvrdili važnost svakog predstavljanja znakova, trenirali smo predstavnika pridruživanja za svaki sloj koristeći metodu salitete na temelju gradient a. Naši eksperimenti na nekoliko različitih zadataka klasifikacije pokazuju brzinu do 22x tijekom infekcije vrijeme bez mnogo žrtve u izvođenju. Također potvrđujemo kvalitet odabranih znakova u našoj metodi koristeći ljudske annotacije u ERASER kriteriji. U usporedbi s drugim široko korištenim strategijama za biranje važnih znakova, poput salicije i pažnje, naš predloženi metod ima značajno manju lažnu pozitivnu stopu u stvaranju racionala. Naš kod je slobodno dostupan na https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 언어 모형은 각종 하류 임무에서 뛰어나다.그러나 이는 통상적으로 높은 지연과 계산을 대가로 자원의 유한한 환경에서의 사용을 방해한다.이 작업에서, 우리는 계산 원가를 낮추는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 층동태를 통해 공헌이 적은 영패를 없애고 길이를 줄여 계산 원가를 낮춘다.모든 표지가 표시하는 중요성을 확인하기 위해 우리는 사다리를 바탕으로 하는 현저한 방법을 사용하여 각 층에 공헌 예측기를 훈련시킨다.우리의 몇 가지 서로 다른 분류 임무에서의 실험은 추리 시간 내에 속도가 22배 높아졌고 성능은 큰 손실이 없다는 것을 보여 주었다.우리는 또한 지우개 기준 중의 인공 주석을 사용하여 우리 방법에서 선택한 표지의 질을 검증했다.다른 광범위하게 사용되는 중요한 표기 선택 전략(예를 들어 현저성과 주의)에 비해 우리가 제시한 방법은 근거를 생성할 때 현저하게 낮은 오보율을 가진다.저희 코드는https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'tr': "Öňki bilinmeli dil nusgalary ýyldyz täzeliklerini görkezildi. Emma bu köplenç ýokary lateksiýa we hasaplamada bolýar, resurslar çykyp düzümlerinde ulanmaklaryny engelleýär. Bu işde, BERT'iň kalkularyň tölegini azaltmak üçin bir ýazşy teklip ederiz. Bizim yöntemimiz dinamik şeklinde katlar tarafından az kömekleyici işaretleri çykar, bu şekilde kiçiräk uzunluğu bolar we bu yüzden kalkularyň bedelini azaltýar. Her metin suratynyň wajyplygyny bejermek üçin, biz her gaty üçin bir gaty gatnaşma töweregini gradient çe tabanly çykyşlygyny ulanýarys. Bizim deneylerimiz birnäçe çeşitli klasifikasyon görevlerinde hatlarymyz 22x tarapyna çenli hatlarymyz çykyş wagtynda gaty bir fedakarlık ýok edip görünýär. Biz hem seçili işaretlerniň keyfiňi EURASER etiketinde insan duýdurmalaryny ulanyp barlaýarys. Başga möhüm möhüm işaretleri saýlamak üçin ullanýan strategiýalary ýaly, süýtgelik we üns almak üçin, teklip eden metodamyzyň dogrylyklary döretmäge has iň ýalňyş möhüm ýigrimiz ýok. Biziň kodymyz boş ýerde bar https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha zilizojifunza umeonyesha utendaji wa wizi katika kazi mbalimbali za mito. Lakini, jambo hili mara nyingi linakuja kwa gharama za urahisi na hisabati kubwa, kuzuia matumizi yao katika mazingira yenye rasilimali. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu ya riwaya kwa kupunguza gharama za kompyuta za BERT kwa kupoteza kwa kiwango cha chini ya mto. Utawala wetu unaondoa vizuri kiasi cha kutoa ishara ndogo kupitia vipande vya juu, na kusababisha ongezeko fupi na hivyo gharama za kompyuta zipunguze. Ili kuamua umuhimu wa uwakilishaji kila alama, tunamfundisha Mkuu wa Udhibiti kwa kila daraja kwa kutumia njia ya usambazaji anayeishi daraja. Majaribio yetu katika kazi mbalimbali za usambazaji zinaonyesha kasi ya kufikia hadi 22x wakati wa mgonjwa bila kutoa sadaka kubwa katika kufanya kazi. Pia tunathibitisha kiwango cha ishara zilizochaguliwa katika njia yetu kwa kutumia matangazo ya binadamu katika bendera ya ERASER. Kwa kulinganisha na mikakati mengine yanayotumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa kuchagua alama muhimu, kama vile uzoefu na usikilizaji, mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa zina kiwango cha chini cha chanzo cha uongo katika kutengeneza vizuri. Our code is freely available at  https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبان\u200cها اجرای ستارگان را در کار\u200cهای مختلف پایین\u200cترین نشان داده\u200cاند. ولی این معمولاً به قیمت بالا و محاسبات می\u200cرسد، مانع استفاده از آنها در تنظیمات محدودیت منبع است. در این کار، ما یک روش نوی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم برای کاهش هزینه\u200cهای کامپیوتری BERT با کمترین خسارت در عملکرد پایین پایین. روش ما به طور dinamikی نشانه های کمتری از طریق طبقه های کمتری را از طریق طبقه ها حذف می کند که به نتیجه طول کوتاه تر و به نتیجه هزینه های کامپیوتری کمتر می کند. برای تعریف اهمیت هر نمایش نشانه\u200cهای نشانه، ما یک نمایش پیش\u200cنمایش مشترک برای هر طبقه با استفاده از روش استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده از استفاده\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در مورد کارهای مختلف مختلف مختلف سرعت تا 22x در زمان آلودگی بدون فداکاری زیادی در انجام نشان می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین کیفیت نشانه\u200cهای انتخاب را در روش ما با استفاده از نشانه\u200cهای انسان در برچسب ERASER تایید می\u200cکنیم. در مقایسه با استراتژی های وسیع استفاده شده برای انتخاب نشانه های مهم، مثل تغییر و توجه، روش پیشنهاد ما یک نرخ مثبتی خیلی کمتر در تولید منطقی دارد. کد ما آزاد در https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'af': "Vorige opgelei taal modele het stellare prestasie in verskillende onderstreem opdragte vertoon. Maar hierdie kom gewoonlik op die koste van hoë latensie en rekenaar, wat hulle gebruik in hulpbron-beperkte instellings hinder. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n nuwe toegang om die rekenaar koste van BERT te reduseer met minimale verlies in onderstreem prestasie. Ons metode dynamiese verwyder minder bydraaiende tekens deur laagte, wat resulteer in korter lengte en volgens daardie kleiner rekenaar koste. Om die belangrikheid van elke token voorstelling te bepaal, tref ons 'n Verdeelde voorstelling vir elke laag met 'n gradient-gebaseerde saliensmetode. Ons eksperimente op verskeie klasifikasie-opdragte vertoon speedskoppe tot 22x tyd tyd tyd sonder baie offer in prestasie. Ons het ook die kwaliteit van die gekose tekens in ons metode geldigheid met die gebruik van menslike notasies in die ERASER benchmark. In vergelyking met ander vaste gebruikte strategies om belangrike tekens te kies, soos salienskap en aandag, het ons voorgestelde metode 'n betydelik minder valse positiewe tempo in die genereering van rationales. Ons kode is vry beskikbaar by https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'sq': 'Modelet e paratrajnuara të gjuhës kanë treguar performancë yjore në detyra të ndryshme poshtë. Por, kjo zakonisht vjen me koston e vonesës së lartë dhe llogaritjes, duke penguar përdorimin e tyre në rregullime të kufizuara me burime. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një qasje të re për reduktimin e kostos llogaritare të BERT me humbje minimale në performancën më poshtë. Our method dynamically eliminates less contributing tokens through layers, resulting in shorter lengths and consequently lower computational cost.  Për të përcaktuar rëndësinë e çdo përfaqësimi të shenjave, ne trajnojmë një parashikues të kontributit për çdo shtresë duke përdorur një metodë sallësisë bazuar në gradient. Eksperimentet tona në disa detyra klasifikuese të ndryshme tregojnë shpejtësi deri në 22x gjatë kohës së përfundimit pa shumë sakrifica në shfaqje. Ne gjithashtu vlerësojmë cilësinë e shenjave të zgjedhura në metodën tonë duke përdorur anotacionet njerëzore në standartin ERASER. Në krahasim me strategjitë e tjera të përdorura gjerësisht për zgjedhjen e shenjave të rëndësishme, të tilla si sallësia dhe vëmendja, metoda jonë e propozuar ka një normë më të ulët pozitive false në gjenerimin e arsyetave. Kodi ynë është i lirë në dispozicion në https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'am': 'ቀድሞ ተማሪ የቋንቋ ሞዴሌዎች በተለዩ ፈሳሾች ሥርዓቶች ላይ የተመሳሳይ ስርዓት አሳይተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን ይህ በተቃውሞ የፍጥረት ውጤት እና ቁጥጥር በሚያቋርጥ መጠቀሚያ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የBERT ቁጥጥር ውጤት ከታናሹ ውጤት የተጎናጸፈ የመረጃ አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ጥያቄያችን በጥያቄ የሚያሳድገውን ምልክቶች በደረጃዎች ውስጥ የሚያሳልፍ ነው፡፡ የአንዱ ምልክት መልዕክት ግንኙነትን ለማረጋገጥ፣ ለሁሉም ደረጃዎች አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ በተለያዩ ትርጉም ሥራ ላይ ፈተናችን በቁጥጥር ውስጥ ብዙ መሥዋዕት ሳይኖር ወደ 22x የሚደርስ ፍጥረት ያሳየናል፡፡ በተመረጠው ምልክቶች ጥሩ አካሄዱን በአERASER ወረቀት ውስጥ የሰው ማስታወቂያ በመጠቀም እናስተካክላለን፡፡ In comparison to other widely used strategies for selecting important tokens, such as saliency and attention, our proposed method has a significantly lower false positive rate in generating rationales.  የሕግ ቃላችን ነፃነት ተገኝቷል https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'hy': "Նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները ցույց են տալիս աստղային արտադրողականությունը տարբեր հետագա խնդիրներում: Սակայն, սովորաբար, սա արժե բարձր ուշացության և հաշվարկների արժեքը, որը կանգնեցնում է նրանց օգտագործման ռեսուրսների սահմանափակ միջավայրում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոտեցում BER-ի հաշվարկների արժեքը նվազեցնելու համար մինիմալ կորստով ներքևի գործողություններում: Մեր մեթոդը դինամիկ կերպով վերացնում է ավելի քիչ ներդրող նշանները շերտերի միջոցով, ինչը հանգեցնում է ավելի կարճ երկարությանը և հետևաբար ավելի ցածր հաշվարկների արժեքը: Որպեսզի որոշենք յուրաքանչյուր նշանի ներկայացման կարևորությունը, մենք յուրաքանչյուր շերտի համար վարժեցնում ենք ներդրումների կանխատեսողին' օգտագործելով աստիճանի հիմնված արտացոլության մեթոդ: Մեր փորձարկումները բազմազան դասակարգման առաջադրանքների վրա ցույց են տալիս արագություններ մինչև 22 անգամ հետևյալ ժամանակի ընթացքում առանց շատ զոհաբերությունների: Մենք նաև ստուգում ենք ընտրված նշանների որակը մեր մեթոդի մեթոդի մեջ օգտագործելով մարդկային նոտացիաներ ERSER հարաբերական նշանի մեջ: Համեմատելով այլ լայնորեն օգտագործված ռազմավարությունների հետ, որպեսզի ընտրենք կարևոր նշաններ, ինչպիսիք են արտաքինությունը և ուշադրությունը, մեր առաջարկած մեթոդը դրական արագություն ունի շատ ավելի ցածր կեղծ դրական արագություն ռացիոն Մեր կոդը անվճար հասանելի է https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'az': "Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri ulduzların müxtəlif aşağıdaki işlərdə göstərdilər. Lakin bu, genellikle yüksək latensiya və hesablama maliyyətinə gəlir, onların istifadəsini qədər çoxlu qurbanlıq qurmaqlarında engel edir. Bu işdə, BERT'nin hesaplama maliyetini azaltmaq üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik. Bizim metodumuz dinamik olaraq daha az köməkçi möcüzələri layers vasitəsilə məhv edir, daha qısa uzunluğu olaraq və buna görə də hesap maliyyətini azaltır. Hər möcüzə göstəricisinin möcüzlüyünü təsdiqləmək üçün hər səviyyənin səviyyəsini təsdiqləyirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz müxtəlif növbənöv klasifikasyon işlərində həyat vaxtında 22x-ə qədər sürəti göstərir. Biz də seçilmiş möcüzələrin keyfiyyətini təsdiqləyirik, ERASER benchmark içində insan nöqtələrini istifadə edərək. Önemli möcüzələri seçmək üçün digər genişliyi istifadə edilən stratejilərə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün, məsələmiz, təklif edilmiş metodumuzun razıllıqları yaratmaq üçün çox düşük pozitif dərəcəsi var. Bizim kodumuz özgür olaraq https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'cs': 'Předškolené jazykové modely ukázaly skvělý výkon v různých následných úkolech. To však obvykle přichází na cenu vysoké latence a výpočtu, což brání jejich použití v nastaveních omezených zdroji. V této práci navrhujeme nový přístup ke snížení výpočetních nákladů BERT s minimální ztrátou následného výkonu. Naše metoda dynamicky eliminuje méně přispívající tokeny přes vrstvy, což vede k kratším délkám a následně nižším výpočetním nákladům. Pro určení důležitosti každé reprezentace tokenů trénujeme prediktor příspěvků pro každou vrstvu pomocí metody salience založené na gradientech. Naše experimenty na několika různých klasifikačních úlohách ukazují zrychlení až 22x během doby inference bez velkých obětí ve výkonu. Dále ověřujeme kvalitu vybraných tokenů v naší metodě pomocí lidských anotací v ERASER benchmarku. Ve srovnání s jinými široce používanými strategiemi pro výběr důležitých tokenů, jako je například významnost a pozornost, má naše navrhovaná metoda výrazně nižší falešně pozitivní míru při generování odůvodnění. Náš kód je volně k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'bs': 'Pre obučeni jezički modeli pokazali su zvijezdane učinke u raznim zadacima. Ali to obično dolazi na troškove visoke latencije i računala, sprječavajući njihovu uporabu u ograničenim nastavama resursa. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi pristup za smanjenje računalnih troškova BERT-a sa minimalnim gubitkom u skladu s poslednjim izvodima. Naša metoda dinamički eliminira manje doprinošće znakove kroz slojeve, što je rezultiralo kraćom dužinom i stoga smanjuje računalne troškove. Da bismo utvrdili važnost svakog predstavljanja znakova, trenirali smo predstavnika pridruživanja za svaki sloj koristeći metodu salitete na osnovu gradient a. Naši eksperimenti na nekoliko različitih klasifikacijskih zadataka pokazuju brzinu do 22x tijekom infekcije vrijeme bez mnogo žrtve u izvedbi. Također potvrđujemo kvalitet odabranih znakova u našoj metodi koristeći ljudske annotacije u ERASER kriteriji. U usporedbi s drugim široko korištenim strategijama za biranje važnih znakova, poput salicije i pažnje, naš predloženi metod ima značajno manju lažnu pozitivnu stopu u stvaranju racionala. Naš kod je slobodno dostupan. https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'bn': 'পূর্বপ্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল বিভিন্ন নিচের কাজে স্টেলার প্রদর্শন করেছে। কিন্তু এটা সাধারণত তাদের সম্পদ সীমিত ব্যবস্থার ব্যবহার বাধা দেয়া উচ্চ সংক্রান্ত এবং গণনার মূল্যে। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করছি বিবের্টের গণনামূল্য কমানোর জন্য, যেটি নিচের নদীর প্রদর্শনের ক্ষতির মধ্যে কম কমে  আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রযুক্তিগত ভাবে স্তরের মাধ্যমে কম অবদানের চিহ্ন মুছে ফেলে, যার ফলে দীর্ঘ দীর্ঘ এবং এর ফলে গণনাত্রিক খরচ কমে। প্রত্যেক চিহ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্বের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ নির্ধারণের জন্য আমরা প্রত্যেক স্তরের জন্য একটি বিনিময় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ দে Our experiments on several diverse classification tasks show speedups up to 22x during inference time without much sacrifice in performance.  আমরা এরআসার বেনম্যার্কে মানুষের ব্যাঙ্কেশন ব্যবহার করে আমাদের মাধ্যমে নির্বাচিত চিহ্নের মান বৈধ করি। গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চিহ্ন নির্বাচনের জন্য অন্যান্য ব্যবহৃত কৌশলের তুলনায় আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ব্যবস্থা এবং মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে বৈশিষ্ট্য আমাদের কোড মুক্তি পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatges pré-entrenats han mostrat rendiment estelar en diverses tasques avall. Però això normalment es produeix a costos d'alta latencia i computació, dificultant l'ús en ambients limitats als recursos. En aquesta feina, proposem un enfocament nou per reduir el cost computacional de BERT amb una pèrdua mínima en el rendiment downstream. El nostre mètode elimina dinàmicament menys fitxes que contribueixen a través de capes, resultant en llargues més curtes i, conseqüentement, en un cost computacional més baix. Per determinar l'importància de cada representació de fitxes, entrenem un Predictor de Contribució per cada capa utilitzant un mètode de saliència basat en gradients. Our experiments on several diverse classification tasks show speedups up to 22x during inference time without much sacrifice in performance.  També validem la qualitat de les fitxes seleccionadas en el nostre mètode fent servir anotacions humanes al punt de referència ERASER. En comparació amb altres estratègies generalment utilitzades per seleccionar fitxes importants, com la saliència i l'atenció, el nostre mètode proposat té un índex fals positiu significativament més baix en generar raons. El nostre codi està lliurament disponible a https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'fi': 'Valmiiksi koulutetut kielimallit ovat osoittaneet erinomaista suorituskykyä erilaisissa loppupään tehtävissä. Mutta tämä tapahtuu yleensä korkean viiveen ja laskennan kustannuksella, mikä estää niiden käyttöä resurssirajoituksissa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uudenlaista lähestymistapaa BERT:n laskennallisten kustannusten vähentämiseksi minimoimalla tuotantoketjun loppupään suorituskyvyn menetyksiä. Menetelmämme eliminoi dynaamisesti vähemmän vaikuttavia poletteja kerroksien kautta, mikä johtaa lyhyempiin pituuksiin ja siten alhaisempiin laskennallisiin kustannuksiin. Määrittääksemme kunkin tunnuksen edustuksen tärkeyden harjoittelemme jokaiselle kerrokselle Contribution Predictorin gradienttiperusteisella saliency-menetelmällä. Kokeemme useissa erilaisissa luokittelutehtävissä osoittavat jopa 22x nopeuksia päättelyajan aikana ilman suurta uhrausta suorituskyvyssä. Validoimme myös valittujen polettien laadun menetelmässämme käyttämällä inhimillisiä huomautuksia ERASER-vertailussa. Verrattuna muihin laajalti käytettyihin strategioihin tärkeiden merkkien valitsemiseksi, kuten näkyvyyteen ja huomioon, ehdotetulla menetelmällä on huomattavasti pienempi väärien positiivisten tulosten määrä perustelujen luomisessa. Koodimme on vapaasti saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'et': 'Eelõpetatud keelemudelid on näidanud suurepärast jõudlust erinevates alljärgnevates ülesannetes. Kuid see tuleb tavaliselt kõrge latentsuse ja arvutuste hinnaga, mis takistab nende kasutamist ressursside piiratud seadetes. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse lähenemisviisi BERT arvutuskulude vähendamiseks minimaalse alltootmisahela jõudluse kaduga. Meie meetod kõrvaldab dünaamiliselt vähem panustavaid tokeneid kihtide kaudu, mille tulemuseks on lühemad pikkused ja seega väiksemad arvutuskulud. Iga märgi esituse tähtsuse kindlaksmääramiseks koolitame iga kihi panuse ennustajat, kasutades gradiendil põhinevat silmapaistvuse meetodit. Meie eksperimendid mitmete erinevate klassifitseerimisülesannetega näitavad kuni 22x kiirust järeldusaja jooksul ilma palju ohvreid jõudluses. Samuti valideerime valitud märkide kvaliteeti oma meetodis, kasutades ERASERi võrdlusaluses inimlikke märkusi. Võrreldes teiste laialdaselt kasutatavate oluliste märkide valimise strateegiatega, nagu näiteks silmapaistvus ja tähelepanu, on meie kavandatud meetodil oluliselt madalam valepositiivse määr põhjenduste genereerimisel. Meie kood on vabalt kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'ha': "@ action: button Amma, wannan yana da kyautar mai ƙaranci da lissafi, kuma yana kange amfani da su a cikin kayan mutane da ke danganta. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani hanyoyi wa ƙaranci aikin BERT da ƙarami hasãra na rayin damƙari. Haƙĩƙa, hanyoyinMu na tafiyar da abu kaɗan da za'a yi amfani da shi a kan zane-zane, kuma yana ƙara tsawo da kashi. To, dõmin ka ƙayyade muhimu ga duk alama mai nuna, za mu coar da Prediction wa kõwane wuri da ake yi amfani da alƙaluman sali a danganta. Our experiments on several diverse classification tasks show speedups up to 22x during inference time without much sacrifice in performance.  Tuna gaskata sifar ayukan waɗanda aka zãɓe cikin hanyarmu da za'a yi amfani da zane-zane mutane cikin bangon ERANER. Ga samfani da waɗansu takwai waɗand a aka yi amfani da wajen amfani da wajen zãɓe alama masu muhimu, kamar sali da aikin muhimmanci, hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata, yana da significant ƙaranci ga sifati na ƙarya a danganta fasalanci. Ana iya amfani da kowanmu https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.", 'jv': 'modells Rasane, digawe iki dadi mbut saiki banjure kelas telu lan tambahan, iso nggawe barang penggunan nêmên ono ora ono wektu nggawe gerakan. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita ngubah perusahaan kelas nêmên kanggo ngersujih dumadhi sing kompatistik BERT nganggo nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas. Awakdhéwé sistem Dinamèki ngregani soko akeh operasi layan karo Layer To define the Importance of every token representation, we vlan a kontribution predikor for every layer use a gradient-basic sulness method. Where\'s the time Awak dhéwé éntuk kaliwat nggawe token gak dhéwé iso nggambar cara-cara anyar tentang karo nggawe layakno string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Ko-kode sing dibutuhke maneh https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש הראו ביצועים כוכביים במשימות אחורות שונות. אבל, זה בדרך כלל מגיע במחיר של אוטנציה גבוהה וחישוב, ומחסום את השימוש שלהם במסדרות מוגבלות משאבים. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים גישה חדשה כדי להפחית את העלות החישובית של BERT עם אובדן מינימלי ביצועים למטה. השיטה שלנו דינמית מחסלת פחות סימנים תורמים דרך שכבות, מה שמוציא לאורכים קצרים ובתוצאה מכך עלות מחשב נמוכה יותר. כדי לקבוע את החשיבות של כל מייצג סימנים, אנו מאמנים מתקן התרומה לכל שכבה באמצעות שיטת מלחיות מבוססת על גרדיינט. הניסויים שלנו על מספר משימות מסווגים מגוונים מראים מהירות עד 22x במהלך זמן ההנחה ללא הרבה הקרבה בהופעה. אנחנו גם מאשרים את איכות הסימנים הנבחרים בשיטתנו באמצעות הערות אנושיות במרמז ERASER. בהשוואה לאסטרטגיות אחרות שמשתמשות בצורה רחבה לבחור סימנים חשובים, כמו מלח ותשומת לב, לשיטה המוצעת שלנו יש קצב חיובי שווא נמוך יותר משמעותי ביצירת הגיוניים. Our code is freely available at  https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'sk': 'Predhodno usposobljeni jezikovni modeli so pokazali odlično zmogljivost pri različnih nadaljnjih nalogah. Vendar to običajno pride na ceno visoke latence in računalništva, kar ovira njihovo uporabo v nastavitvah z omejenimi viri. V tem delu predlagamo nov pristop za zmanjšanje računalniških stroškov BERT z minimalno izgubo v nadaljnji verigi. Naša metoda dinamično odpravlja manj prispevkov žetonov skozi plasti, kar ima za posledico krajše dolžine in posledično nižje računalniške stroške. Za določitev pomembnosti vsake predstavitve žetonov usposabljamo napovedovalca prispevkov za vsako plast z uporabo metode slikanja, ki temelji na gradientu. Naši eksperimenti na več različnih klasifikacijskih nalogah kažejo hitrosti do 22-krat med sklepnim časom brez veliko žrtvovanja v zmogljivosti. Kakovost izbranih žetonov potrjujemo tudi v naši metodi z uporabo človeških opomb v referenčnem merilu ERASER. V primerjavi z drugimi pogosto uporabljenimi strategijami za izbiro pomembnih žetonov, kot sta vidnost in pozornost, ima naša predlagana metoda bistveno nižjo stopnjo lažnih pozitivnih razlogov. Naša koda je prosto dostopna na spletni strani https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་འགྲུལ་སྟངས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱུང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། འདི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དུ་ཆེ་མཐོ་རིང་དང་རྩིས་རྩིས་ཐོག་གི་དགོས་འབྲི་ན། དེ་དག་གི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཁོངས་ལ་སྒྲིག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྩིས་གཞི་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་རྩིས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཉེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་ཀྱང་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དེ་འདྲ་བཤུས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། To determine the importance of each token representation, we train a Contribution Predictor for each layer using a gradient-based saliency method. ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འཚོལ་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་འགྲེལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཚད་འཕྱུར་འགྲོས་མཐུན་དུས་ཚོད་22xབར་སྟོན་པ། ང་ཚོས་མིའི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་ནང་གི་མིང་རྟགས་ལ་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་མིང་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དཔེར་ན། ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་གཞན་དང་སྤྱད་ནས། ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་སྟོང་པར་བྱིན་མི་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/amodaresi/AdapLeR.'}
{'en': 'An Unsupervised Multiple-Task and Multiple-Teacher Model for Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'ar': 'تقييم استنساخ الكمي لنتائج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية', 'fr': 'Évaluation quantifiée de la reproductibilité des résultats de la PNL', 'pt': 'Avaliação da reprodutibilidade quantificada dos resultados da PNL', 'es': 'Evaluación de reproducibilidad cuantificada de los resultados de PNL', 'ja': 'NLP結果の定量化された再現性評価', 'zh': 'NLP实量化再现性评估', 'hi': 'NLP परिणामों की मात्रा निर्धारित पुनरुत्पादकता मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Количественная оценка воспроизводимости результатов NLP', 'ga': 'Measúnú In-atáirgtheachta Cainníochtaithe ar Thorthaí an NLP', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Az NLP eredményeinek mennyiségi reprodukciós értékelése', 'el': 'Ποσοτική αξιολόγηση της αναπαραγωγιμότητας των αποτελεσμάτων NLP', 'it': 'Valutazione quantitativa della riproducibilità dei risultati del PNL', 'kk': 'NLP нәтижесінің көлемдейтін қайталанушылығын оқу', 'lt': 'Kvantifikuotas NLP rezultatų reprodukcijos vertinimas', 'mk': 'Quantified Reproducibility Assessment of NLP Results', 'ms': 'Penghargaan Kemudahan Kemudahan Dikuantifikasikan Keputusan NLP', 'ml': 'NLP ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Valutazzjoni Kwantifikata tar-Riproduċibbiltà tar-Riżultati tal-NLP', 'mn': 'NLP үр дүний хэмжээний дахин хөгжүүлэх чадварын оценка', 'no': 'Quantifisert overbyggingsassensering av NLP- resultat', 'pl': 'Ilościowa ocena reprodukcyjności wyników NLP', 'ro': 'Evaluarea cuantificată a reproductibilității rezultatelor PNL', 'sr': 'Quantizirana procjena reproduktivnosti rezultata NLP-a', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Quantified Reproducility Assessment of NLP results', 'sv': 'Kvantifierad reproducerbarhetsbed√∂mning av resultaten fr√•n NLP', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học về khả năng xoay chuyển ước tính', 'bg': 'Количествена оценка на възпроизводимостта на резултатите от НЛП', 'nl': 'Kwantitatieve reproduceerbaarheidsbeoordeling van NLP-resultaten', 'da': 'Kvantificeret reproducerbarhedsvurdering af NLP-resultater', 'hr': 'Quantizirana procjena reproduktivnosti rezultata NLP-a', 'de': 'Quantifizierte Reproduzierbarkeitsbewertung der NLP-Ergebnisse', 'ko': 'NLP 결과에 대한 양적 재현성 평가', 'id': 'Pengevaluasi Kemudahan Reproduksibilitas dari Hasil NLP', 'fa': 'ارزیابی قابلیت بازسازی Quantified Reproduction of NLP Results', 'sw': 'Tathmini ya Matokeo ya NLP', 'tr': 'NLP netijesini janlaşdyrylmak', 'af': 'Quantifiseerde Herstellingsversoeking van NLP Resultate', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i Përkthyeshmërisë së Kuantifikuar i Rezultateve të NLP', 'am': 'Quantified Reproducibility Assessment of NLP Results', 'hy': 'ՆԼՊ արդյունքների քանակական վերարտադրողականության գնահատումը', 'bn': 'NLP ফলাফলের মূল্য', 'az': 'NLP Sonuçlarının Quantified Reproducibility Assessment of NLP Results', 'bs': 'Quantizirana procjena reproduktivnosti rezultata NLP-a', 'ca': 'Evaluació Quantificada de la Reproducibilitat dels Resultats de la NLP', 'cs': 'Kvantifikované posouzení reprodukovatelnosti výsledků NLP', 'et': 'NLP tulemuste kvantitatiivne reprodutseeritavuse hindamine', 'fi': 'NLP:n tulosten määrällinen toistettavuuden arviointi', 'sk': 'Ocena količinske reproduktibilnosti rezultatov novega programa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'NLP འོངས་འབྲས་ཐོག་གི་བསྐྱར་འབྱེད་རུང་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བ', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'הערכת ניצחון מוגדרת של תוצאות NLP'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual named entity recognition task is one of the critical problems for evaluating the potential transfer learning techniques on low resource languages. Knowledge distillation using pre-trained multilingual language models between source and target languages have shown their superiority in transfer. However, existing cross-lingual distillation models merely consider the potential transferability between two identical single tasks across both domains. Other possible auxiliary tasks to improve the learning performance have not been fully investigated. In this study, based on the knowledge distillation framework and multi-task learning, we introduce the similarity metric model as an auxiliary task to improve the cross-lingual NER performance on the target domain. Specifically, an entity recognizer and a similarity evaluator are first trained in parallel as two teachers from the source domain. Then, two tasks in the student model are supervised by these teachers simultaneously. Empirical studies on the three datasets across 7 different languages confirm the effectiveness of the proposed model.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة وتختبر طريقة لإجراء تقييم التكاثر الكمي (QRA) الذي يعتمد على مفاهيم وتعريفات من علم القياس. ينتج QRA درجة واحدة تقدر درجة استنساخ نظام معين ومقياس التقييم ، على أساس الدرجات من النسخ المختلفة والاختلافات بينها. نحن نختبر QRA على 18 نظامًا مختلفًا وتوليفة من مقاييس التقييم (تتضمن مهام NLP وأنواع تقييم متنوعة) ، لكل منها النتائج الأصلية ونتائج استنساخ واحدة إلى سبع نتائج. ينتج عن طريقة QRA المقترحة درجات درجة التكاثر التي يمكن مقارنتها عبر نسخ متعددة ليس فقط من نفس الدراسات الأصلية ، ولكن أيضًا من دراسات أصلية مختلفة. وجدنا أن الطريقة المقترحة تسهل رؤى أسباب الاختلاف بين النسخ ، ونتيجة لذلك ، تسمح باستخلاص استنتاجات حول جوانب تصميم النظام و / أو التقييم التي يجب تغييرها من أجل تحسين إمكانية التكاثر.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit et teste une méthode d'évaluation de la reproductibilité quantifiée (QRA) basée sur des concepts et des définitions issus de la métrologie. QRA produit un score unique estimant le degré de reproductibilité d'un système et d'une mesure d'évaluation donnés, sur la base des scores et des différences entre les différentes reproductions. Nous testons QRA sur 18 combinaisons de systèmes et de mesures d'évaluation différentes (impliquant diverses tâches de PNL et types d'évaluation), pour chacune desquelles nous avons les résultats originaux et un à sept résultats de reproduction. La méthode QRA proposée produit des scores de degré de reproductibilité qui sont comparables entre de multiples reproductions non seulement de la même étude, mais également de différentes études originales. Nous constatons que la méthode proposée facilite la compréhension des causes de variation entre les reproductions et, par conséquent, permet de tirer des conclusions sur les aspects du système et/ou de la conception de l'évaluation qui doivent être modifiés afin d'améliorer la reproductibilité.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve e testa um método de avaliação de reprodutibilidade quantificada (QRA) baseado em conceitos e definições da metrologia. QRA produz uma única pontuação estimando o grau de reprodutibilidade de um determinado sistema e medida de avaliação, com base nas pontuações e diferenças entre diferentes reproduções. Testamos QRA em 18 combinações diferentes de sistemas e medidas de avaliação (envolvendo diversas tarefas de PNL e tipos de avaliação), para cada uma das quais temos os resultados originais e um a sete resultados de reprodução. O método QRA proposto produz pontuações de grau de reprodutibilidade que são comparáveis em várias reproduções não apenas do mesmo, mas também de diferentes estudos originais. Achamos que o método proposto facilita insights sobre causas de variação entre reproduções e, como resultado, permite tirar conclusões sobre quais aspectos do sistema e/ou design de avaliação precisam ser alterados para melhorar a reprodutibilidade.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe y prueba un método para llevar a cabo la evaluación de reproducibilidad cuantificada (QRA) que se basa en conceptos y definiciones de la metrología. El QRA produce una única puntuación que estima el grado de reproducibilidad de un sistema y una medida de evaluación dados, sobre la base de las puntuaciones y las diferencias entre las diferentes reproducciones. Probamos la QRA en 18 combinaciones diferentes de sistemas y medidas de evaluación (que implican diversas tareas de PNL y tipos de evaluación), para cada una de las cuales tenemos los resultados originales y de uno a siete resultados de reproducción. El método QRA propuesto produce puntuaciones de grado de reproducibilidad que son comparables en múltiples reproducciones no solo de los mismos estudios originales, sino también de diferentes estudios originales. Encontramos que el método propuesto facilita la comprensión de las causas de variación entre reproducciones y, como resultado, permite sacar conclusiones sobre qué aspectos del diseño del sistema y/o la evaluación deben cambiarse para mejorar la reproducibilidad.', 'ja': '計量学の概念と定義に基づいた定量的再現性評価（ QRA ）を実施するための方法を説明し、試験する。 ＱＲＡは、異なる再現からのスコア及び異なる再現間の差に基づいて、所与のシステム及び評価尺度の再現性の程度を推定する単一のスコアを生成する。 私たちは、18の異なるシステムと評価尺度の組み合わせ（多様なNLPタスクと評価の種類を含む）でQRAをテストし、それぞれについて元の結果と1〜7の再現結果を持っています。 提案されたQRA法は、同じだけでなく、異なる元の研究の複数の再現にわたって同等の再現度スコアを生成する。 提案された方法は、複製間の変動の原因に関する洞察を容易にし、結果として、再現性を向上させるためにシステムおよび/または評価設計のどの側面を変更する必要があるかについて結論を導き出すことを可能にすることを発見しました。', 'zh': '本述并试一本于计量学概与定义量化再现性评(QRA)之法。 QRA以复制品之分异,生成单分,度给定之可重复性也。 凡18之统,与评(异NLP,与评)试QRA,各有始终,与七复制终。 所建QRA法所生重复性分数不啻同本异端复制品多有可比性。 臣等观之,所以有助于深知复制品变异者,故可得而论也,所以变易统/、料度者哪些方面以崇重复性也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर मात्रात्मक पुनरुत्पादन मूल्यांकन (क्यूआरए) को पूरा करने के लिए एक विधि का वर्णन और परीक्षण करता है जो मेट्रोलॉजी से अवधारणाओं और परिभाषाओं पर आधारित है। QRA एक एकल स्कोर का उत्पादन करता है जो किसी दिए गए सिस्टम और मूल्यांकन माप की पुनरुत्पादन की डिग्री का अनुमान लगाता है, स्कोर के आधार पर, और विभिन्न प्रतिकृतियों के बीच के अंतर के आधार पर। हम 18 अलग-अलग सिस्टम और मूल्यांकन माप संयोजनों (विविध एनएलपी कार्यों और मूल्यांकन के प्रकारों को शामिल करते हुए) पर क्यूआरए का परीक्षण करते हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक के लिए हमारे पास मूल परिणाम और एक से सात प्रजनन परिणाम हैं। प्रस्तावित क्यूआरए विधि डिग्री-ऑफ-पुनरुत्पादन स्कोर का उत्पादन करती है जो न केवल एक ही, बल्कि विभिन्न, मूल अध्ययनों के कई पुनरुत्पादनों में तुलनीय हैं। हम पाते हैं कि प्रस्तावित विधि पुनरुत्पादन के बीच भिन्नता के कारणों में अंतर्दृष्टि की सुविधा प्रदान करती है, और परिणामस्वरूप, इस बारे में निष्कर्ष निकालने की अनुमति देती है कि पुनरुत्पादन में सुधार के लिए सिस्टम और / या मूल्यांकन डिजाइन के किन पहलुओं को बदलने की आवश्यकता है।', 'ru': 'Этот документ описывает и испытывает метод для проводить количественную оценку воспроизводимости (QRA) которая основана на понятиях и определениях от метрологии. QRA дает один балл, оценивая степень воспроизводимости данной системы и оценочной меры на основе баллов и различий между различными репродукциями. Мы тестируем QRA на 18 различных комбинациях систем и оценочных показателей (включая различные задачи NLP и типы оценки), для каждого из которых мы имеем исходные результаты и от одного до семи результатов воспроизведения. Предлагаемый метод QRA дает оценки степени воспроизводимости, которые сопоставимы по нескольким репродукциям не только одного и того же, но и различных оригинальных исследований. Мы обнаружили, что предлагаемый метод облегчает понимание причин различий между воспроизведениями и, как следствие, позволяет сделать выводы о том, какие аспекты конструкции системы и/или оценки необходимо изменить для улучшения воспроизводимости.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos agus tástáil ar mhodh chun measúnú in-atáirgthe cainníochtaithe (QRA) a dhéanamh atá bunaithe ar choincheapa agus sainmhínithe ón méadreolaíocht. Táirgeann QRA scór amháin a dhéanann meastachán ar mhéid an in-atáirgtheachta a bhaineann le córas ar leith agus beart meastóireachta, ar bhonn na scóir ó atáirgthe éagsúla agus na ndifríochtaí eatarthu. Déanaimid tástáil ar QRA ar 18 teaglaim beart córais agus meastóireachta éagsúla (lena n-áirítear tascanna NLP éagsúla agus cineálacha meastóireachta), a bhfuil na torthaí bunaidh againn agus torthaí atáirgeadh ó aon go seacht gcinn acu. Táirgeann an modh QRA atá beartaithe scóir céime in-atáirgtheachta atá inchomparáide thar il-atáirgthe, ní hamháin de na staidéir chéanna chéanna ach de bhunstaidéir dhifriúla freisin. Feicimid go n-éascaíonn an modh molta léargais ar chúiseanna éagsúlachta idir atáirgthe, agus mar thoradh air sin, ceadaítear tátail a bhaint amach faoi na gnéithe de dhearadh córais agus/nó meastóireachta ar gá iad a athrú chun in-atáirgtheacht a fheabhsú.', 'ka': 'ეს წერტილის განსაზღვრება და ტესტირება მეტროლოგიის კონტაქტიფიკაციული რემპუკენტიფიკაციის განსაზღვრება (QRA) რომელიც მეტროლოგიის კონცეტების და განსაზღვრების ბაზეზია Name ჩვენ QRA-ს 18 განსხვავებული სისტემის და განსაზღვრების კომბიციების შესახებ (განსხვავებული NLP დავალებების და განსაზღვრების ტიპების შესახებ), რომელიც ჩვენ აქვთ ორიგინალური შედეგი და ერთი-შვიდი QRA პროგრამის შესაძლებელი პროგრამის შესაბამისი წარმოდგენება, რომლებიც მრავალი განმხლებების შესაბამისი წარმოდგენებაში არა მხოლოდ იგივე, მაგრამ განსხვავებული, ორიგი ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ პროგრამის შესაძლებელი მეტი განსხვავებების მიზეზების შესახებ, და შემდეგ შესაძლებელია გადაწყვეტილებების შესახებ, რომელიც სისტემის და/ან განსხვავების განსხვავებების განსხვავება უნდა გა', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány leírja és teszteli a méréstechnikai fogalmakon és definíciókon alapuló mennyiségi reprodukálhatósági értékelés (QRA) elvégzésének módszerét. A QRA egyetlen pontszámot állít elő, amely egy adott rendszer reprodukálhatóságának mértékét és értékelési mértékét becsüli meg, a különböző reprodukciók pontszámai és különbségei alapján. A QRA-t 18 különböző rendszer- és értékelési mérési kombinációval teszteljük (különböző NLP feladatokat és értékelési típusokat magában foglalva), amelyek mindegyikének eredeti eredményeit és egy-hét reprodukciós eredményt kapunk. A javasolt QRA módszer reprodukálhatósági fokozatokat eredményez, amelyek nem csak ugyanazon, hanem különböző eredeti vizsgálatok reprodukciójával összehasonlíthatók. Megállapítjuk, hogy a javasolt módszer megkönnyíti a reprodukciók közötti eltérések okainak betekintését, és ennek eredményeképpen következtetéseket lehet levonni arról, hogy a rendszer és/vagy értékelés tervezésének milyen aspektusait kell megváltoztatni a reprodukálhatóság javítása érdekében.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει και δοκιμάζει μια μέθοδο για την ποσοτική αξιολόγηση της αναπαραγωγιμότητας (QRA) που βασίζεται σε έννοιες και ορισμούς από τη μετρολογία. Το QRA παράγει ένα ενιαίο σκορ που εκτιμά τον βαθμό αναπαραγωγής ενός συγκεκριμένου συστήματος και μέτρου αξιολόγησης, με βάση τις βαθμολογίες και τις διαφορές μεταξύ των διαφορετικών αναπαραστάσεων. Δοκιμάζουμε σε 18διαφορετικούς συνδυασμούς συστημάτων και μετρήσεων αξιολόγησης (που περιλαμβάνουν διάφορες εργασίες και τύπους αξιολόγησης), για κάθε έναν από τους οποίους έχουμε τα αρχικά αποτελέσματα και ένα έως επτά αποτελέσματα αναπαραγωγής. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος παράγει βαθμούς αναπαραγωγής που είναι συγκρίσιμες σε πολλαπλές αναπαραγωγές όχι μόνο των ίδιων, αλλά και διαφορετικών, πρωτότυπων μελετών. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος διευκολύνει την κατανόηση των αιτίων διακύμανσης μεταξύ των αναπαραστάσεων και, ως εκ τούτου, επιτρέπει την εξαγωγή συμπερασμάτων σχετικά με το ποιες πτυχές του σχεδιασμού του συστήματος ή/και της αξιολόγησης πρέπει να αλλάξουν προκειμένου να βελτιωθεί η αναπαραγωγιμότητα.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive e testa un metodo per effettuare la valutazione quantificata della riproducibilità (QRA) che si basa su concetti e definizioni della metrologia. QRA produce un singolo punteggio che stima il grado di riproducibilità di un dato sistema e misura di valutazione, sulla base dei punteggi e delle differenze tra le diverse riproduzioni. Testiamo QRA su 18 diverse combinazioni di sistemi e misure di valutazione (che coinvolgono diversi compiti NLP e tipi di valutazione), per ciascuno dei quali abbiamo i risultati originali e da uno a sette risultati di riproduzione. Il metodo QRA proposto produce punteggi di grado di riproducibilità comparabili in più riproduzioni non solo degli stessi, ma anche di diversi studi originali. Scopriamo che il metodo proposto facilita la comprensione delle cause di variazione tra riproduzioni e, di conseguenza, permette di trarre conclusioni su quali aspetti del sistema e/o della progettazione di valutazione devono essere modificati per migliorare la riproducibilità.', 'lt': 'This paper describes and tests a method for carrying out quantified reproducibility assessment (QRA) that is based on concepts and definitions from metrology.  QRA sukuria vieną tašką, pagal kurį apskaičiuojamas tam tikros sistemos reprodukcijos laipsnis ir vertinimo matas, remiantis skirtingų reprodukcijų rezultatais ir skirtumais tarp jų. Tikriname QRA 18 skirtingų sistemų ir vertinimo priemonių derinių (įskaitant įvairias NLP užduotis ir vertinimo tipus), kiekvienam iš jų turime pradinius rezultatus ir nuo vieno iki septynių reprodukcijos rezultatų. Siūlomu QRA metodu gaunami dauginamosios reprodukcijos laipsnio rezultatai, kurie yra panašūs ne tik tų pačių, bet ir įvairių pradinių tyrimų metu. Mes manome, kad siūlomas metodas palengvina supratimą apie įvairių reprodukcijų priežastis ir todėl leidžia daryti išvadas, kokius sistemos ir (arba) vertinimo projekto aspektus reikia pakeisti siekiant pagerinti reprodukcijos galimybes.', 'mk': 'Оваа вест опишува и тестира метод за спроведување квантификувана проценка на репродуктибилитетот (QRA) кој се базира на концепти и дефиниции од метрологијата. QRA произведува една оценка која го проценува степенот на репродуктибилност на одреден систем и оценката, врз основа на оценките од различните репродукции и разликите меѓу нив. Ги тестираме КРА на 18 различни комбинации на систем и проценка (вклучувајќи различни НЛП задачи и видови на проценка), за секој од кои ги имаме оригиналните резултати и еден до седум резултати на репродукцијата. Предложениот метод QRA произведува оценки на степен на репродуктибилитет кои се споредливи низ повеќе репродукции не само од истите, туку и од различни оригинални студии. We find that the proposed method facilitates insights into causes of variation between reproductions, and as a result, allows conclusions to be drawn about what aspects of system and/or evaluation design need to be changed in order to improve reproducibility.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan dan menguji kaedah untuk melakukan penilaian kemuliaan kuantifikasi (QRA) yang berdasarkan konsep dan definisi dari metrologi. QRA menghasilkan skor tunggal yang menghargai darjah penyembahan sistem tertentu dan ukuran penilaian, berdasarkan skor dari, dan perbezaan antara, penyembahan yang berbeza. Kami menguji QRA pada 18 sistem berbeza dan kombinasi ukuran penilaian (melibatkan tugas NLP berbeza dan jenis penilaian), untuk masing-masing kami mempunyai keputusan asal dan satu hingga tujuh keputusan reproduksi. The proposed QRA method produces degree-of-reproducibility scores that are comparable across multiple reproductions not only of the same, but also of different, original studies.  Kami mendapati bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan memudahkan pemahaman mengenai penyebab variasi antara reproduksi, dan sebagai hasilnya, membolehkan kesimpulan untuk dicetak mengenai apa aspek sistem dan/atau rancangan penilaian perlu diubah untuk meningkatkan reproduksi.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз метрологияның концепциялары мен анықтамаларына негізделген көптеген репродуктивдік оқу (QRA) әдісін таңдап, сынап береді. QRA келтірілген жүйелік мен оқу өлшемінің қайталану деңгейінің негізінде және түрлі қайталану арасындағы айырмашылығының бір нүкте жасайды. Біз QRA-ды 18 түрлі жүйелік және оқиға түрлі жинақтарды тексереміз (түрлі NLP тапсырмалары мен оқиға түрлі түрлері) және әрбіріміздің бастапқы нәтижелері бар, бірінші және жетін QRA әдісі бірнеше репродукциялық деңгейінде салыстырылатын, бірнеше репродукциялық деңгейінде салыстырылатын, бірақ басқа, басқа зерттеулердің деңгейінде салыстырылатын. Біз ұсынған тәсілі репродукциялық арасындағы айырмашылық себептеріне көмектеседі. Сонымен қатар, жүйе мен/немесе оқу дизайнының қандай аспекттерін өзгерту үшін түсініктерді жасауға мүмкіндік береді.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും പരീക്ഷിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് മെട്രോളജിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ആശയങ്ങളും വിശദീകരണങ്ങളും അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. QRA produces a single score estimating the degree of reproducibility of a given system and evaluation measure, on the basis of the scores from, and differences between, different reproductions.  18 വ്യത്യസ്തംഭത്തില്\u200d ക്യൂററിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്തമായ അളവിലൂടെ (NLP ജോലികളും വിലാസങ്ങളും ചേര്\u200dത്തു), അതില്\u200d ഓരോരുത്തര്\u200dക്കും നമു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്യൂ രീതിയില്\u200d ഡിഗ്രി പ്രവർത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സ്കോര്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പല പ്രവർത്തികങ്ങളിലും അത് ഒരേ പ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രവർത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളുടെ കാരണങ്ങളായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെയും /അല്ലെങ', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver og testar ein metode for å gjera kvantifisert reproduktivitetsverdievaluering (QRA) som er basert på konseptar og definisjonar frå metrologikk. QRA produserer eit enkelt poeng som vurderer graden på reproduktiviteten av eit gitt system og evalueringsmål, på grunn av poeng frå, og ulike forskjeller mellom ulike reproduksjonar. Vi testar QRA på 18 forskjellige systemet og evalueringsmålingar (med forskjellige NLP- oppgåver og typar evaluering), for kvar av dei vi har originale resultata og ein til syv reproduksjonsresultat. Dette første QRA-metoden produserer grader av reproduktivitetsprogrammet som er sammenlignbar over fleire reproduksjonar, ikkje berre av same, men også av ulike originale studiar. Vi finn at den foreslåde metoden gjer tilgjengelege innsyningar i grunnen av variasjonar mellom reproduksjon, og som resultat, lèt deg teikna konklusjonar om kva aspektar av systemet og/eller evalueringsdesign må endrast for å forbedra reproduksjonsverktøy.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi u jittestja metodu għat-twettiq ta’ valutazzjoni kwantifikata tar-riproduċibbiltà (QRA) li huwa bbażat fuq kunċetti u definizzjonijiet mill-metroloġija. QRA produces a single score estimating the degree of reproducibility of a given system and evaluation measure, on the basis of the scores from, and differences between, different reproductions.  We test QRA on 18 different system and evaluation measure combinations (involving diverse NLP tasks and types of evaluation), for each of which we have the original results and one to seven reproduction results.  Il-metodu QRA propost jipproduċi punteġġi tal-grad ta’ riproduċibbiltà li huma komparabbli bejn riproduzzjonijiet multipli mhux biss tal-istess, iżda wkoll ta’ studji oriġinali differenti. Aħna nsibu li l-metodu propost jiffaċilita l-għarfien dwar il-kawżi ta’ varjazzjoni bejn ir-riproduzzjonijiet, u bħala riżultat, jippermetti li jsiru konklużjonijiet dwar liema aspetti tad-disinn tas-sistema u/jew tal-evalwazzjoni jeħtieġ li jinbidlu sabiex titjieb ir-riproduċibbiltà.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje i testuje metodę przeprowadzania kwantyfikowanej oceny odtwarzalności (QRA), opartą na koncepcjach i definicjach z metrologii. QRA tworzy pojedynczy wynik szacujący stopień powtarzalności danego systemu i miary oceny, na podstawie wyników z różnych reprodukcji i różnic między nimi. Testujemy QRA na 18-ciu różnych kombinacjach pomiarów systemowych i oceniających (obejmujących różne zadania NLP i rodzaje oceny), dla każdego z nich mamy oryginalne wyniki oraz jeden do siedmiu wyników reprodukcji. Proponowana metoda QRA zapewnia stopień odtwarzalności, który jest porównywalny w wielu reprodukcjach nie tylko tego samego, ale również różnych, oryginalnych badań. Stwierdzono, że proponowana metoda ułatwia wgląd w przyczyny różnic między reprodukcjami, a w rezultacie pozwala na wyciągnięcie wniosków o tym, jakie aspekty systemu i/lub projektu oceny należy zmienić w celu poprawy powtarzalności.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie și testează o metodă de evaluare a reproductibilității cuantificate (QRA) bazată pe concepte și definiții din metrologie. QRA produce un singur scor care estimează gradul de reproductibilitate al unui anumit sistem și măsură de evaluare, pe baza scorurilor și a diferențelor dintre diferitele reproduceri. Testăm QRA pe 18 combinații diferite de sisteme și măsură de evaluare (care implică diverse sarcini PNL și tipuri de evaluare), pentru fiecare dintre acestea avem rezultatele originale și unul până la șapte rezultate de reproducere. Metoda QRA propusă produce scoruri de gradul de reproductibilitate comparabile în mai multe reproduceri nu numai ale acelorași, ci și ale diferitelor studii originale. Considerăm că metoda propusă facilitează perspectiva cauzelor variației dintre reproduceri și, ca urmare, permite tragerea de concluzii cu privire la aspectele proiectării sistemului și/sau evaluării care trebuie modificate pentru a îmbunătăți reproductibilitatea.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас метрологийн ойлголт болон тодорхойлолтуудын үндсэн хэмжээний үржвэрлэлтийн үнэлгээ (QRA) хийх аргыг тайлбарлаж, шалгаж байна. QRA нь өгөгдсөн системийн үржвэрлэлтийн хэмжээг, үнэлгээний хэмжээг тооцоолж, өөр үржвэрлэлтийн ялгаатай тооцоолж, нэг тооцоо бий болгодог. Бид QRA-г 18 өөр систем дээр шалгаж, үнэлэх хэмжээний нийлүүлэлтийг (NLP даалгавар, үнэлэх төрлийн даалгавар, үнэлэх төрлийн төрлийн) шалгаж үзүүлдэг. Энэ бүх нь эхний үр дүн, нэг-7 үржүүлэлтийн үр дүн QRA хувилбар нь зөвхөн ижил үржүүлэлт биш, бас өөр өөр, эхний судалгаанд харьцуулагддаг олон үржүүлэлтийн хэмжээст үржүүлэлтийн оноо бий болгодог. Бид санал өгсөн арга нь үржвэрлэлийн хоорондын өөрчлөлтийн шалтгаануудыг ашиглаж, үржвэрлэлтийн сайжруулахын тулд системийн болон/эсвэл үнэлгээний дизайны асуудлыг өөрчлөх хэрэгтэй талаар шийдвэрлэх боломжтой юм.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව විස්තර කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය (QRA) විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඒක මෙ Name අපි වෙනස් පද්ධතිය 18යි QRA පරීක්ෂා කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණය අනුමාණය අනුමාණය (වෙනස් NLP වැඩක් සහ පරීක්ෂණය වර්ගයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා), අපි හ QRA පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම වගේම ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් විතරයි, වෙනස් විද අපි හොයාගන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය අතර වෙනස් විදියට පරිස්සම් විදියට පරිස්සම් සහ/නැත්තම් විදියට පරිස්සම් විදියට වෙනස', 'so': 'Warqaddan ayaa qoraya oo imtixaamaya qaab lagu sameynayo qiimeynta qofka ka soo celinta (QRA) oo lagu saleynayo fikrada iyo qoraalka meteorologiga. QRA wuxuu soo saaraa koox keliya oo qiimeynaya shahaadada dubaarinta nidaamka la siiyey iyo qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta qiimeynta ay ka timaadaan iyo kala duwanaanshaha kala duduwan dubaarinta. Waxaan QRA ku imtixaamaynaa 18 nidaam oo kala duduwan iyo kooban qiyaasta qiimeynta (kaas oo ku jira shuqullada NLP oo kala duduwan iyo qiimeynta kala duduwan), taas oo mid kastaba waxaan leenahay midhaha asalka ah iyo hal ilaa toddoba ka soo saarida. Midabka QRA ee la soo jeeday ayaa soo saara qiimaha qoyska qoyska oo la mid ah, kuwaas oo isbarbarbarka dubaarinta oo kala duduwan, laakiin waxaa ka mid ah waxbarasho rasmi ah. Waxaynu helnaa in qaabkii la soo jeeday ay ay ku hagaajiyaan aragtida sababaha kala duwan dubaarinta, sababtaas darteed waxaa la ogolaa in la sameeyo dhamaadyo ka saabsan waxa ay u baahan tahay in la beddelo qaabka nidaamka iyo/ama in loo beddelo in loo beddelo qofka la beddelo.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver och testar en metod fﾃｶr att genomfﾃｶra kvantifierad reproducerbarhetsbedﾃｶmning (QRA) som bygger pﾃ･ begrepp och definitioner frﾃ･n metrologi. QRA producerar en enda poﾃ､ng som berﾃ､knar graden av reproducerbarhet hos ett givet system och utvﾃ､rderingsmﾃ､t, pﾃ･ grundval av poﾃ､ng frﾃ･n och skillnader mellan olika reproduktioner. Vi testar QRA pﾃ･ 18 olika system- och utvﾃ､rderingsmﾃ､tkombinationer (med olika NLP-uppgifter och utvﾃ､rderingstyper), fﾃｶr var och en av dessa har vi originalresultat och ett till sju reproduktionsresultat. Den fﾃｶreslagna QRA-metoden ger resultat av reproducerbarhet som ﾃ､r jﾃ､mfﾃｶrbara ﾃｶver flera reproduktioner, inte bara av samma, utan ocksﾃ･ av olika originalstudier. Vi finner att den fﾃｶreslagna metoden underlﾃ､ttar insikter i orsakerna till variation mellan reproduktioner och dﾃ､rmed gﾃｶr det mﾃｶjligt att dra slutsatser om vilka aspekter av system- och/eller utvﾃ､rderingsdesign som behﾃｶver ﾃ､ndras fﾃｶr att fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttra reproducerbarheten.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje i testira metodu za provedbu kvantificiranog procjene reproduktivnosti (QRA), koja se temelji na konceptima i definicijama iz metrologije. QRA proizvodi jedan rezultat koji procjenjuje stepen reproduktivnosti određenog sistema i mjere procjene, na osnovu rezultata i razlika između različitih reprodukcija. Testiramo QRA na 18 različitih sistema i kombinacija mjera procjene (uključujući različite zadatke NLP i vrste procjene), za svaku od njih imamo originalne rezultate i jedan do sedam rezultata reprodukcije. Predložena metoda QRA proizvodi rezultate reproduktivnosti stepena koja su usporedni u višestrukim reprodukcijama ne samo od istog, već i od različitih, originalnih ispitivanja. Mi smatramo da je predložena metoda olakšava uvid u uzroke varijacije između reprodukcije, i kao rezultat, omogućava da se zaključki izvlače o tome kakvim aspektima sistema i/ili dizajna procjene treba promijeniti kako bi se poboljšala reproduktivnost.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது மற்றும் சோதிக்கும் முறையில் உள்ள கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் நெறிமுறையிலிருந்து அடிப்படையில் உள QRA ஒரே மதிப்பெண்ணை உருவாக்குகிறது, கொடுக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையின் பிராணிப்பு மற்றும் மதிப்பின் மதிப்பெண்களை மதிப்பிடும் மதிப்பினை மதி 18 வேறு வித்தியாசமான முறைமையில் கிராவைச் சோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் மதிப்பின் அளவு முறைகளையும் (வேறு NLP பணிகளையும் மதிப்பின் வகைகளையும் சேர்க நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட QRA முறைமையில் வடிவமைப்பு பெறுதல் மதிப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது அது பல முறைமைகளில் ஒப்பிடுகிறது அதே போல் மட்டும் அல் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் புதுப்பித்தலுக்கு இடையே மாறுபாடு காரணங்களுக்கு உபயோகிக்கும் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் முறைமையில் மாற்றும்', 'ur': 'This paper describes and tests a method for performing quantified reproducibility assessment (QRA) that is based on concepts and definitions from metrology. Name ہم 18 مختلف سیسٹم پر QRA کو آزماتے ہیں اور ارزیابی اندازہ اندازے (مختلف NLP کاموں اور ارزیابی طریقوں کے ساتھ) اور ان میں سے ہر ایک کے لئے ہمارے اولین نتیجے ہیں اور ایک سے سات پیدائش نتیجے ہیں۔ پیشنهاد کی QRA طریقہ ایک ہی طریقہ سے نہیں، بلکہ مختلف، اصلی تحقیقات کے درجے کی بازگشت کا اسکور پیدا کرتا ہے۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ تغییرات کے باعث تغییرات کی وجہ سے نظر آسانی کرتی ہے اور اس کے نتیجہ سے، نتیجہ سے نتیجے کو سیستم اور/یا ارزیابی طریقہ کی کس طریقے کے متعلق تغییر کرنے کی ضرورت دیتی ہے تاکہ تغییر پھیلانے کی ت', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz metrologiya g'oyalarining asosida yaratilgan qiymatni bajarishga (QRA) qiymatini aniqlash usulini anglatadi va imtiyozmaydi. Name Biz QRA bilan 18 boshqa tizim va qiymatning qiymatlarini ko'paytuvchimiz (har xil NLP vazifalar va qiymatlar turlari bilan birga asl natijalari va bitta ta ta'sirlik natijalari bor. Koʻrsatilgan QRA usuli qo'llanmalarning darajasini qo'shish darajasi yaratadi. Bu bir necha takrorlanuvchiga teng bo'lgan darajaga mos keladi, balki boshqa asl o'qituvchilardan ham o'xshash. We find that the proposed method facilitates insights into causes of variation between reproductions, and as a result, allows conclusions to be drawn about what aspects of system and/or evaluation design need to be changed in order to improve reproducibility.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả và thử một phương pháp để thực hiện đánh giá định vị sinh sản có thể xác định định định định định được định lượng sinh sản. Điểm QRA tạo ra một điểm ước lượng duy nhất về mức độ sinh sản của một hệ thống và một biện pháp đánh giá, dựa trên điểm xuất ra và sự khác nhau giữa các trình bày khác nhau. Chúng tôi kiểm tra QC trên khác hệ thống và đo đạc (gồm nhiều công việc khác nhà NLP) vì chúng tôi có kết quả gốc, và một tới bảy kết quả sinh. Với phương pháp Qla đề nghị, tỉ lệ sinh sản có khả năng sinh sản có thể so sánh với nhiều người không chỉ có cùng một mà còn có các nghiên cứu gốc khác nhau. Chúng tôi thấy rằng phương pháp được đề nghị giúp tìm hiểu về các nguyên nhân biến đổi giữa các bản mẫu, và kết quả là, cho phép kết luận về những khía cạnh của hệ thống và/hay thiết kế đánh giá cần phải được thay đổi để nâng cao khả năng sinh sản.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver og tester en metode til at udføre kvantificeret reproducerbarhedsvurdering (QRA), der er baseret på begreber og definitioner fra metrologi. QRA udarbejder en enkelt score, der estimerer graden af reproducerbarhed af et givet system og evalueringsmål på grundlag af scorerne fra og forskellene mellem forskellige reproduktioner. Vi tester QRA på 18 forskellige system- og evalueringsmålekombinationer (involverer forskellige NLP-opgaver og evalueringstyper), hvor vi hver især har de oprindelige resultater og et til syv reproduktionsresultater. Den foreslåede QRA-metode giver resultater af reproducerbarhedsgrad, der er sammenlignelige på tværs af flere reproduktioner, ikke blot af den samme, men også af forskellige originale undersøgelser. Vi finder ud af, at den foreslåede metode letter indsigt i årsagerne til variation mellem reproduktioner, og som følge heraf gør det muligt at drage konklusioner om, hvilke aspekter af system- og/eller evalueringsdesign der skal ændres for at forbedre reproducerbarheden.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt und testet eine Methode zur quantifizierten Reproduzierbarkeitsbewertung (QRA), die auf Konzepten und Definitionen aus der Messtechnik basiert. QRA erstellt einen einzigen Score, der den Grad der Reproduzierbarkeit eines gegebenen Systems und Bewertungsmaßes auf der Grundlage der Ergebnisse und Unterschiede zwischen verschiedenen Reproduktionen schätzt. Wir testen QRA an 18-verschiedenen System- und Auswertungsmesskombinationen (mit verschiedenen NLP-Aufgaben und Auswertungsarten), für die wir jeweils die Originalergebnisse und ein bis sieben Reproduktionsergebnisse haben. Die vorgeschlagene QRA-Methode erzeugt Reproduzierbarkeitswerte, die über mehrere Reproduktionen nicht nur derselben, sondern auch verschiedener Originalstudien hinweg vergleichbar sind. Wir stellen fest, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode Einblicke in Ursachen von Variationen zwischen Reproduktionen ermöglicht und somit Rückschlüsse darauf ermöglicht, welche Aspekte des System- und/oder Evaluationsdesigns geändert werden müssen, um die Reproduzierbarkeit zu verbessern.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft en test een methode voor het uitvoeren van gekwantificeerde reproduceerbaarheidsbeoordeling (QRA) die is gebaseerd op concepten en definities uit de metrologie. QRA produceert een enkele score die de mate van reproduceerbaarheid van een bepaald systeem en evaluatiemaat schat, op basis van de scores van en verschillen tussen verschillende reproducties. We testen QRA op 18-tal verschillende systeem- en evaluatiemeetcombinaties (waarbij diverse NLP-taken en evaluatietypen betrokken zijn), waarvan we elk de originele resultaten en één tot zeven reproductieresultaten hebben. De voorgestelde QRA-methode levert graad van reproduceerbaarheid scores op die vergelijkbaar zijn over meerdere reproducties, niet alleen van dezelfde, maar ook van verschillende, originele studies. We stellen vast dat de voorgestelde methode inzicht geeft in oorzaken van variatie tussen reproducties, en daardoor conclusies kan worden getrokken over welke aspecten van systeem- en/of evaluatieontwerp gewijzigd moeten worden om de reproduceerbaarheid te verbeteren.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje i testira metodu za provedbu kvantificiranog procjene reproduktivnosti (QRA), koja se temelji na konceptima i definicijama iz metrologije. QRA proizvodi jednostavan rezultat koji procjenjuje stupnju reproduktivnosti određenog sustava i mjere procjene, na osnovu rezultata i razlika između različitih reprodukcija. Testiramo QRA na 18 različitih sustava i kombinacija mjera procjene (uključujući različite zadatke NLP-a i vrste procjene), za svaku od njih imamo originalne rezultate i jedan do sedam rezultata reprodukcije. Predložena QRA metoda proizvodi rezultate reproduktivnosti stepenice koje su usporedbene u višestrukim reprodukcijama ne samo od istog, već i od različitih, originalnih ispitivanja. Mi smatramo da je predložena metoda olakšava uvid u uzroke varijacije između reprodukcije i kao rezultat, omogućava da se zaključki izvuču o tome kakvim aspektima sustava i/ili dizajna procjene moraju promijeniti kako bi se poboljšala reproduktivnost.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва и тества метод за извършване на количествена оценка на възпроизводимостта (QRA), който се основава на концепции и определения от метрологията. QRA произвежда единичен резултат, който оценява степента на възпроизводимост на дадена система и мярка за оценка въз основа на оценките от различните репродукции и разликите между тях. Изпитваме КРА на 18 различни системи и измервателни комбинации (включващи различни задачи на НЛП и видове оценка), за всяка от които имаме оригиналните резултати и един до седем резултата за възпроизвеждане. Предложеният метод произвежда оценки за степен на възпроизводимост, които са сравними при множество репродукции не само на едни и същи, но и на различни оригинални изследвания. Установяваме, че предложеният метод улеснява проникването в причините за вариация между възпроизвежданията и в резултат на това позволява да се направят изводи за това какви аспекти на системния и/или оценяващия дизайн трябва да бъдат променени, за да се подобри възпроизводимостта.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan dan menguji metode untuk melakukan penilaian reproduksi kuantifikasi (QRA) yang berdasarkan konsep dan definisi dari metrologi. QRA menghasilkan skor tunggal memperkirakan derajat reproduksibilitas sistem tertentu dan ukuran evaluasi, berdasarkan skor dari, dan perbedaan antara, reproduksi yang berbeda. Kami menguji QRA pada 18 sistem yang berbeda dan kombinasi ukuran evaluasi (yang melibatkan berbagai tugas NLP dan jenis evaluasi), untuk masing-masing kita memiliki hasil asli dan satu sampai tujuh hasil reproduksi. Metode QRA yang diusulkan menghasilkan skor darjah-reproduksibilitas yang dapat dibandingkan melalui reproduksi berbilang tidak hanya yang sama, tetapi juga dari studi asli yang berbeda. Kami menemukan bahwa metode yang diusulkan memudahkan penglihatan pada penyebab variasi antara reproduksi, dan sebagai hasilnya, memungkinkan kesimpulan untuk ditarik tentang aspek apa dari sistem dan/atau desain evaluasi perlu diubah untuk meningkatkan reproduksi.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روشی را برای انجام ارزیابی بازآفرینی (QRA) مقدار تعریف می\u200cکند و آزمایش می\u200cکند که بر روی نظریه\u200cها و تعریف\u200cها از مترولوژی بنیاد دارد. Name ما QRA را در سیستم ۱۸ متفاوت آزمایش می\u200cکنیم و ترکیب اندازه اندازه اندازه\u200cها (شامل کار های مختلف NLP و نوع ارزیابی) برای هر یک از آنها نتیجه اصلی و یک تا هفت نتیجه تولید داریم. این روش QRA پیشنهاد امتیاز بازگشت درجه\u200cی بازگشت را تولید می\u200cکند که در طول تعداد\u200cهای متعدد قابل مقایسه است نه تنها از یکسان، بلکه همچنین از مطالعه\u200cهای متفاوت، اصلی. ما متوجه می\u200cشویم که این روش پیشنهاد به دلایل تغییرات بین تولید و به نتیجه، اجازه می\u200cدهد نتیجه\u200cها را درباره\u200cی آنچه نقطه\u200cهای سیستم و/یا طراحی ارزیابی نیاز دارد تغییر دهند تا بتوانند تولید کنند.', 'sw': 'Papa hii inaelezea na kujaribu njia ya kutekeleza tathmini za uwazi (QRA) ambazo zinategemea dhana na maelezo kutoka kwenye utafiti. QRA inatengeneza score moja akikadiria kiwango cha uwajibikaji wa mfumo uliopatikana na hatua za uchunguzi, kwa msingi wa vipimo vya juu na tofauti kati ya uzazi tofauti. Tunajaribu QRA kwenye mfumo wa mifumo 18 tofauti na mifumo ya uchunguzi (ikiwa ni pamoja na kazi mbalimbali za NLP na aina mbalimbali za uchunguzi), ambazo kila mmoja tuna matokeo ya asili na matokeo ya uzalishaji moja hadi saba. Utawala wa QRA unapendekezwa unatengeneza vipimo vya kiwango cha uzazi ambavyo vinafananishwa katika uzazi mbalimbali si tu wa namna hiyo, bali pia katika tafiti mbalimbali za asili. Tunapata kwamba mbinu hiyo inayopendekezwa inawezesha kuongezeka kwa sababu za mabadiliko kati ya uzazi, na matokeo yake, inaruhusu matokeo ya kuchukuliwa kuhusu masuala yanayohusu mfumo na/au ubunifu wa uchunguzi ili kuboresha utumwa.', 'ko': '본고는 계량학적 개념과 정의를 바탕으로 하는 정량재현성평가(QRA) 방법을 묘사하고 테스트했다.QRA는 복제품에 따른 점수와 차이점에 따라 하나의 단일 점수를 만들어 주어진 시스템과 평가 지표의 재현성을 평가하는 데 사용한다.우리는 18가지 서로 다른 시스템과 평가 측정 조합(서로 다른 NLP 작업과 평가 유형과 관련)에서 QRA를 테스트했다. 각 조합에 대해 우리는 원시적인 결과와 1~7개의 복제 결과를 가지고 있다.제시된 QRA 방법이 발생하는 중복성 정도의 득점은 같은 여러 번의 중복에서 비교가 가능할 뿐만 아니라 서로 다른 원시 연구에서도 비교가 가능하다.우리는 제시한 방법이 복제품 간의 차이의 원인을 깊이 있게 이해하는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 발견했기 때문에 시스템 및/또는 평가 디자인의 어떤 측면이 재현성을 높이기 위해 바뀌어야 하는지에 대한 결론을 얻을 수 있다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz metrologiýanyň düşünjeleri we düşünjelerine daýanýan ýagdaýy çykmak üçin bir yöntemi tassyýar we testi edýär. QRA berilen sistemiň yeniden çykylylylşygyň derejesini we deňlenme ölçüsiniň derejesini, netijesinden we farklılyklaryň arasynda bir sany bar. Biz QRA'yı 18 farklı sistemde test edip, deňlenme çözümlerini (NLP görevleri we deňlenme tarzda) çözümlerini test edip, her biri üçin original netijelerimiz bar we bir täze 7 netijesi bar. QRA üýtgetmeli zady birnäçe çapda deňleşirlik sanlaryň derejesini üretýär. Bu çapda birnäçe çapda deňleşirlik sanlaryň deňleşiklik däldir, birnäçe üýtgeşikleri däldir. Ýüklemek üçin teklip eden yöntemiň üýtgewleri çarpyşlygyň sebäbini a ňsat getirilýär we netijesi bolsa sistemiň we/ýa çykyş tassyýasynyň nähili aspektlerini üýtgetmek üçin çözümlerini çykarmak üçin çözümlere mümkin edýäris.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe en toets 'n metode vir die uitvoer van quantifiseerde reproduktiviteit-evaluering (QRA) wat gebaseer is op konsepte en definisies van metrologie. QRA produseer 'n enkele telling wat die grade van reproduktiviteit van 'n gegewe stelsel en evaluasie maat uitgevaar, op die basis van die telling van, en verskille tussen, verskillende reproduksie. Ons toets QRA op 18 verskillende stelsel en evaluasie maat kombinasies (invoer verskillende NLP opdragte en tipes evaluasie), vir elke van hulle het ons die oorspronklike resultate en een tot sewe reproduksie resultate. Die voorgestelde QRA metode produseer grad van reproduksibiliteit telling wat vergelykbaar is oor veelvuldige reproduksie nie alleen van dieselfde nie, maar ook van ander, oorspronklike studie. Ons vind dat die voorgestelde metode geïnvarings in veroorsaak van veranderinge tussen reproduksie, en as 'n resultaat, toelaat toesluitings om te teken oor wat aspekte van stelsel en/of evaluasie ontwerp moet verander word om reproduksibiliteit te verbeter.", 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan dhe teston një metodë për kryerjen e vlerësimit kuantifikuar të riprodhimit (QRA) që është bazuar në koncepte dhe përkufizime nga metrologjia. QRA prodhon një pikë të vetme që vlerëson gradën e riprodhimit të një sistemi të caktuar dhe masën e vlerësimit, në bazë të pikave nga riprodhimet e ndryshme dhe dallimeve midis tyre. We test QRA on 18 different system and evaluation measure combinations (involving diverse NLP tasks and types of evaluation), for each of which we have the original results and one to seven reproduction results.  The proposed QRA method produces degree-of-reproducibility scores that are comparable across multiple reproductions not only of the same, but also of different, original studies.  Ne zbulojmë se metoda e propozuar lehtëson kuptimet në shkaqet e ndryshimit midis riprodhimeve dhe si rezultat, lejon përfundimet të tërhiqen rreth aspekteve të dizajnit të sistemit dhe/ose vlerësimit që duhen ndryshuar me qëllim që të përmirësohet riprodhimi.', 'az': "Bu kağıt metrolojik nəzəriyyətlərə və nəzəriyyətlərə dayanan kvantitatlı reproducibility təcrübəsi (QRA) tərzini çəkir və sınayır. QRA verilən sistemin və değerlendirmə ölçüsinin yenilənməsi dərəcəsini hesablayan tək nöqtəsi ürəkləndirir, müxtəlif yenilənmələr arasındakı fərqlərə görə. Biz QRA'yı 18 fərqli sistemdə test edirik və değerlendirmə ölçüləri birlikdə (müxtəlif NLP işləri və müxtəlif değerlendirmə məqsədilə) imtahana çəkirik. Onların hər biri üçün orijinal sonuçları var və birinin yeddi təhsil sonuçları var. QRA metodu, çoxlu reproduciyyətlərdə müəyyən edilən dərəcə-dərəcə reproduktivlıq nöqtələrini ürəkləyir, yalnız eyni deyil, yalnız farklı, orijinal təcrübələrin. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz metod yenilənmələr arasındakı dəyişiklik məsələlərinə nəzər verər və sonuç olaraq sistemin və/yaxud değerlendirmə dizaynının nə aspektlərinin dəyişiklik edilməsi üçün çəkilərlərin çəkilməsini mümkün edər.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም ከሜትሮሎጂ የተመሠረተውን የውጤቶች እና ትርጓሜዎችን በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የብሔራዊ አካሄድ (QRA) የሚሞክረውን እና የሚሞክረውን ነው፡፡ QRA በተለየ ቁጥር እና በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት በተለያዩ የስርዓት ግንኙነት እና የክስተት መስኮት የሚቆጠር አንድ ነጥብ ነጥብ አቀረበ፡፡ QRA በተለያዩ ስርዓት እና ማስታወቂያውን መጠቀሚያ (የNLP ስራዎችን እና የዓይነቶች መለያየት እናደርጋለን) እናሞክራለን፡፡ ለሁሉም የመጀመሪያው ፍሬቶች እና አንዱን እስከ ሰባት አካል ፍሬቶች አለን፡፡ በተገኘው የQRA ሥርዓት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ተማሪዎች ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የውይይት ግንኙነትን በሙሉ ልውቀት እንዲያበረታ እና ፍጻሜውን ከሲስተም እና/ወይም አካሄስ ጥናት እንዲለውጥ እንዲያስፈልገዋል፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকার ব্যাখ্যা করছে এবং পরীক্ষা করছে যে পরীক্ষা করা হচ্ছে পরিমাণ প্রবণতার মূল্য (কিউরা) যা মেট্রোলজিত থেকে ধারণা ও সংখ্যার উপর ভ কিউরা একটি স্কোর তৈরি করেছে একটি প্রদত্ত বিভিন্ন প্রজন্মের ভিত্তিতে দেয়া সিস্টেমের প্রবণতার ডিগ্রি এবং মূল্যায়নের মাধ্যমে। আমরা কিউরাকে ১৮ ভিন্ন ব্যবস্থায় পরীক্ষা করি এবং মূল্যবোধমূল্য মিনিটের মাধ্যমে (যার মধ্যে বিভিন্ন এনএলপি কাজ এবং ধরনের মূল্যের মাধ্যমে) পরীক্ প্রস্তাবিত কিউরা পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গবেষণাও তৈরি করেছে। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি প্রজন্মের মধ্যে পার্থক্যের কারণে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি সুবিধা প্রদান করে এবং এর ফলে সিস্টেম এবং/অথবা মূল্যায়ন ডিজাইনের কারণে কি প', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեթոդը նկարագրում է և ստուգում է չափչափելի վերարտադրողականության գնահատման մեթոդը, որը հիմնված է մետրոլոգիայի գաղափարների և սահմանումների վրա: QRԱ-ն արտադրում է մեկ գնահատականի, որը գնահատում է տվյալ համակարգի վերարտադրողականության մակարդակը և գնահատականի չափումը, հիմնված տարբեր վերարտադրողականության գնահատականների և տարբերությունների միջև: Մենք ստուգում ենք QRA ն 18 տարբեր համակարգերի և գնահատման չափումների համադրությունների վրա (ներառյալ բազմազան ՆԼՊ խնդիրներ և գնահատման տեսակներ), որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրի համար մենք ունենք սկզբնական արդյունքները և մեկ-յոթ վերարտադր Առաջարկված QRA մեթոդը ստեղծում է վերարտադրողականության աստիճանի գնահատականներ, որոնք համեմատուկ են բազմաթիվ վերարտադրողականությունների մեջ ոչ միայն նույն, այլ նաև տարբեր, սկզբնական ուսումնասիրությունների մեջ: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ առաջարկած մեթոդը հեշտացնում է բազմազանության տարբերության պատճառների ընկալումը, և որպես արդյունք, հնարավորություն է տալիս եզրակացություններ գտնել այն մասին, թե համակարգի և (կամ) գնահատման դիզայնի ինչ ասպեկտները պետք է փոխվեն վերարտադր', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje i testira metodu za provedbu kvantificiranog procjene reproduktivnosti (QRA), koja se temelji na konceptima i definicijama iz metrologije. QRA proizvodi jedini rezultat koji procjenjuje stepenicu reproduktivnosti određenog sistema i mjere procjene, na osnovu rezultata i razlika između različitih reprodukcija. Testiramo QRA na 18 različitih sustava i kombinacija mjera procjene (uključujući različite zadatke NLP i vrste procjene), za svaku od njih imamo originalne rezultate i jedan do sedam rezultata reprodukcije. Predložena metoda QRA proizvodi rezultate reproduktivnosti stepenice koje su usporedbene u višestrukim reprodukcijama ne samo od istog, već i od različitih, originalnih ispitivanja. Mi smatramo da je predložena metoda olakšava uvid u uzroke varijacije između reprodukcije i kao rezultat, omogućava da se zaključki izvuču o tome kakvim aspektima sustava i/ili dizajna procjene moraju promijeniti kako bi se poboljšala reproduktivnost.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje a testuje metodu provádění kvantifikovaného hodnocení reprodukovatelnosti (QRA), která je založena na pojmech a definicích z metrologie. QRA vytváří jediné skóre odhadující stupeň reprodukovatelnosti daného systému a hodnotícího měřítka na základě skóre z různých reprodukcí a rozdílů mezi nimi. QRA testujeme na osmnácti různých kombinacích systémů a hodnotících měřítek (zahrnujících různé NLP úlohy a typy hodnocení), pro každou z nich máme originální výsledky a jeden až sedm reprodukčních výsledků. Navrhovaná metoda QRA vytváří skóre reprodukovatelnosti srovnatelné mezi více reprodukcemi nejen stejných, ale i různých originálních studií. Zjišťujeme, že navržená metoda usnadňuje pohled na příčiny rozdílů mezi reprodukcemi a díky tomu umožňuje vyvodit závěry o tom, jaké aspekty systému a/nebo návrhu hodnocení je třeba změnit, aby se zlepšila reprodukovatelnost.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu i prova un mètode per a fer una evaluació de reproducibilitat quantificada (QRA) basada en conceptes i definicions de la metrologia. QRA produeix una única puntuació que estima el grau de reproducibilitat d'un sistema i la mesura d'evaluació, basant-se en les puntuacions dels diferents reproduccions. Testem QRA en 18 diferents combinacions de sistemes i mesures d'evaluació (que impliquen diverses tasques i tipus d'evaluació de NLP), per cada una de les quals tenim els resultats originals i un a set resultats de reproducció. El mètode QRA proposat produeix puntuacions de grau de reproducibilitat comparables en múltiples reproduccions no només del mateix, sinó també d'estudis originals diferents. Trobem que el mètode proposat facilita la comprensió de les causes de variació entre les reproduccions, i com a resultat, permet que es treuen conclusions sobre quins aspectes del disseny del sistema i/o de l'evaluació han de canviar per millorar la reproducibilitat.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä kuvataan ja testataan menetelmä kvantifioidun toistettavuuden arviointiin (QRA), joka perustuu metrologian käsitteisiin ja määritelmiin. QRA tuottaa yhden pisteen, joka arvioi tietyn järjestelmän toistettavuuden ja arviointitoimenpiteen eri reproduktioiden tulosten ja niiden välisten erojen perusteella. Testaamme QRA:ta 18 eri järjestelmä- ja arviointimittayhdistelmällä (joihin sisältyy erilaisia NLP-tehtäviä ja arviointityyppejä), joista jokaisella on alkuperäiset tulokset ja yhdestä seitsemään lisääntymistulosta. Ehdotettu QRA-menetelmä tuottaa toistettavuusasteen pisteet, jotka ovat vertailukelpoisia useiden samojen, mutta myös erilaisten alkuperäisten tutkimusten moniversioiden välillä. Toteamme, että ehdotettu menetelmä helpottaa käsitystä eri reproduktioiden vaihtelun syistä ja mahdollistaa sen, että voidaan tehdä johtopäätöksiä siitä, mitä järjestelmän ja/tai arviointisuunnittelun näkökohtia on muutettava toistettavuuden parantamiseksi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse ja katsetatakse kvantifitseeritud reprodutseeritavuse hindamise meetodit, mis põhineb metroloogia mõistetel ja määratlustel. QRA annab ühe skoori, millega hinnatakse konkreetse süsteemi reprodutseeritavust ja hindamismeetmeid erinevate reprodutseerimiste skooride ja erinevuste põhjal. Testime QRA-d 18 erineva süsteemi- ja hindamismeetmete kombinatsiooniga (mis hõlmavad erinevaid NLP ülesandeid ja hindamistüüpe), millest igaühel on algsed tulemused ja üks kuni seitse reproduktsiooni tulemust. Kavandatud QRA meetod annab reprodutseeritavuse astme skoorid, mis on võrreldavad mitme reproduktsiooni puhul mitte ainult sama, vaid ka erinevate algsete uuringute puhul. Leiame, et kavandatud meetod võimaldab teha järeldusi selle kohta, milliseid süsteemi ja/või hindamiskujunduse aspekte tuleb muuta reprodutseeritavuse parandamiseks.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje in testira metodo za izvajanje kvantificirane ocene ponovljivosti (QRA), ki temelji na konceptih in opredelitvah iz meroslovja. QRA ustvari en sam rezultat, ki ocenjuje stopnjo ponovljivosti določenega sistema in merilo ocenjevanja na podlagi rezultatov različnih reprodukcij in razlik med njimi. QRA testiramo na 18 različnih kombinacijah sistemskih in evalvacijskih meril (ki vključujejo različne naloge NLP in vrste evalvacije), za vsako od katerih imamo originalne rezultate in enega do sedem rezultatov reprodukcije. Predlagana metoda QRA ustvarja ocene stopnje reproduktibilnosti, ki so primerljive pri večkratnih reprodukcijah iste, temveč tudi različnih izvirnih študij. Ugotavljamo, da predlagana metoda olajša vpogled v vzroke razlik med reprodukcijami in posledično omogoča sklepanje o tem, katere vidike sistema in/ali ocenjevanja je treba spremeniti, da se izboljša reproduktivnost.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan yana bayyana kuma yana jarraba wata hanyoyi wa aikin haƙurin a cikakken ƙaddara a dubiyar (QR) wanda aka ƙaddara a kan zato da fassarar da fassarar daga metrologi. QR na samar da wata nau'a guda, yana ƙidãya cewa wata sifar za'a zartar da kwamfyutan na'urar da ma'anar, a kan karatun na, da sãɓãnin a tsakanin dubu-daban. Tuna jarraba QR a kan 18-wasu na'ura da ma'aunin ƙaddara (da ke cikin aikin NLP da wasu irin evaluation), dukkan cikinsu yana da matsalar farko da matsalar za'a ta ƙara bakwai. Tsarin QR da aka buƙatar da shi, yana fitar da shawarar-na-dubiyar da aka daidaita kowace kowace-dubiyar, ba ta zama ba fãce da shi, kuma da wasu fasanni daban. Tuna gane cewa metoden da aka buƙata, yana amfani da gannai masu cikin wata variant a tsakanin dufe, kuma yana yarda a nuna matsayin a kan wanne masu cikin tsari da/ko kuwa an canza zaɓen muhimmada dõmin a kyautata duba.", 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi nggambar lan ujaran sistem kanggo nggawe prelimurapun cara-cara nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas nggawe barang kelas nggawe barang kelas nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Name Awak dhéwé éntukno NLP sing berartil 18 sistem sampeyan karo paketen nggawe sistem sing berartil gak nggawe dolanan tanggal nggawe dolanan NLP sampeyan karo paketen types of asserti, sabên sing uwong arep tuku dadi sing berartil dhéwé, dadi wis akhir sedhaya punika inggawe dadi Perintah sing dipunanggunian Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi perusahaan akeh urip nggawe éntuk karo perusahaan anyar nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang urip, dadi sak, tuku dhéwé kawit karo perusahaan sistem lan/obang nggawe ngucap depurasi winih kanggo mbatalé urip-urip.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר ומבחן שיטה לבצע הערכת התחזוקות המכונתת (QRA) שמבוססת על הרעיונות וההגדרות ממטרולוגיה. QRA יוצר נקודה אחת שמערכת את דרך ההחזקה של מערכת מסוימת ומדוד ההערכה, על בסיס נקודות מהחזרות שונות אנחנו בודקים QRA על 18 שילובים מערכת שונים ומדידות עריכה (כולל משימות NLP ומגוונים של עריכה), לכל אחד מהם יש לנו את התוצאות המקוריות ו-1 עד 7 תוצאות התרבות. שיטת QRA המוצעת יוצרת תוצאות מעמד של התרבות שישוואות בין התרבות רבות לא רק באותו, אלא גם של מחקרים מקוריים שונים. אנו מוצאים שהשיטה המוצעת מוקלת בהבנות לגבי סיבות ההתנגדות בין התרבות, ובתוצאה מכך, מאפשרת למסקנות לגבי איזה היבטים של מערכת ו/או עיצוב הערכה צריכים להשתנות כדי לשפר את התרבות.', 'bo': 'This paper describes and tests a method for carrying out quantified reproducibility assessment (QRA) that is based on concepts and definitions from metrology. QRA એ བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་བསྒྱུར་རྩིས་ཚད་གཅིག་རྐྱེན་བ་ཅིག་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་མ་ལག་གཞན་18ཡིས་མཉམ་དུ་ལས་རྟགས་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་QRA་ལམ་ལུགས་དེ་ནི་ཕལ་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་གྲངས ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་དེ་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚོད་ལ་འགྱུར་བའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་རྐྱེན་འདུག།'}
{'en': 'Discriminative Marginalized Probabilistic Neural Method for Multi-Document Summarization of Medical Literature', 'ar': 'تعمل الرموز النادرة على تحطيم جميع الرموز: تحسين إنشاء النص العصبي عبر بوابة التدرج التكيفي لحفلات الزفاف المميزة النادرة', 'es': 'Los tokens raros degeneran todos los tokens: mejora de la generación de texto neuronal a través de la compuerta de degradado adaptable para incrustaciones de tokens raros', 'pt': 'Tokens Raros Degeneram Todos os Tokens: Melhorando a Geração de Texto Neural via Gradient Gating Adaptativo para Incorporações de Token Raros', 'fr': 'Les jetons rares dégénèrent tous les jetons\xa0: amélioration de la génération de texte neuronal via le contrôle de gradient adaptatif pour les intégrations de jetons rares', 'ja': 'レアトークンはすべてのトークンを変性させる：レアトークン埋め込みのための適応的なグラデーションゲーティングを介したニューラルテキスト生成の向上', 'zh': '稀有令牌退化诸令牌:因其稀有令牌嵌者渐变门控神经文本成', 'ru': 'Редкие жетоны Дегенерация всех жетонов: улучшение генерации нейронного текста с помощью адаптивных градиентных стробирующих импульсов для редких вложений жетонов', 'hi': 'दुर्लभ टोकन पतित सभी टोकन: दुर्लभ टोकन एम्बेडिंग के लिए अनुकूली ग्रेडिएंट गेटिंग के माध्यम से तंत्रिका पाठ पीढ़ी में सुधार', 'ga': 'Laghdaíonn Comharthaí Uathúla Gach Comhartha: Giniúint Néar-théacs a Fheabhsú trí Ghlasú Grádán Oiriúnaitheach le haghaidh Leabaithe Comhartha Neamhchoitianta', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Σπάνια Σημάδια αποδυναμώνουν όλα τα Σημάδια: Βελτίωση της δημιουργίας νευρωνικού κειμένου μέσω της προσαρμοστικής συλλογής βαθμίδων για τις Ενσωματώσεις σπάνιων Σημάτων', 'hu': 'Ritka tokenek Degenerálják az összes tokent: az idegi szöveg generálásának javítása adaptív átmeneti összegyűjtéssel a ritka tokenbeágyazásokhoz', 'it': "Degenerare tutti i token: migliorare la generazione di testo neurale tramite il Gating Gradiente Adattivo per l'incorporazione di token rari", 'kk': 'Барлық токендерді құру керек токендері: Нейрондық мәтінді құру көмегімен адаптикалық градиенттің түйінісін құру', 'lt': 'Reti požymiai naikina visus požymius: patobulina nervinių tekstų generaciją taikant pritaikytą laipsnišką rinkimą retams požymiams įdėti', 'mk': 'Ретки токени ги дегенерираат сите токени: подобрување на генерацијата на неурален текст преку адаптивна грејтна група за ретки токенски вградувања', 'ms': 'Rare Tokens Degenerate All Tokens: Improving Neural Text Generation via Adaptive Gradient Gating for Rare Token Embeddings', 'ml': 'Rare Tokens Degenerate All Tokens: Improving Neural Text Generation via Adaptive Gradient Gating for Rare Token Embeddings', 'mt': 'Tokens Rari Jiġġeneraw it-Tokens Kollha: Titjib fil-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test Newrali permezz ta’ Ġbir Adattattiv ta’ Gradjenti għal Embeddings ta’ Tokens Rari', 'mn': 'Хэдэн ховор Токенууд бүх Токенуудыг бий болгодог: Сэтгэл Текст үүсгэлтэй сайжруулах нь ховор Токен оролцуулалт', 'no': 'Vanskeleg tokenar deklarar alle tokenar: forbetra generering av neiraltekst ved hjelp av tilpassande fargeovergangar for rekkelige tokenar', 'pl': 'Rzadkie żetony Degenerują wszystkie żetony: poprawa generowania tekstu neuronowego poprzez adaptacyjne gromadzenie gradientów dla osadzeń rzadkich żetonów', 'ro': 'Jetoane rare Degenerarea tuturor jetoanelor: îmbunătățirea generarii de text neural prin intermediul Gating Gradient Adaptive pentru încorporarea jetoanelor rare', 'sr': 'Rijetki tokeni uništavaju sve tokene: poboljšanje generacije neuronskog teksta putem adaptivnog gradjanskog otvaranja za retke integracije tokena', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Dhammaan Tokens Rare: Improving Text Generation via Adaptive Gradient Gating for Rare Token', 'sv': 'Sällsynta Tokens Degenerera Alla Tokens: Förbättra Neural Text Generation via Adaptive Gradient Gating för Sällsynta Token Embeddings', 'ta': 'Rare Tokens Degenerate All Tokens: Improving Neural Text Generation by Adaptive Gradient Gating for Rare Token Embeddings', 'ur': 'اندھیرے ٹوکنز تمام ٹوکنز کو نازل کرتا ہے: نئورل ٹیکسٹ پیدا کرنے کے ذریعہ اڈپٹیٹ گریڈینٹ گٹنگ کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرتا ہے', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name, tổn hao tổn thương môi trường, tổn hao tổn thương tổng thể', 'bg': 'Редки токени дегенерират всички токени: Подобряване на генерирането на неврален текст чрез адаптивна градиентна врата за вграждане на редки токени', 'da': 'Sjældne poletter nedbryder alle poletter: Forbedrer generering af neural tekst via adaptiv gradient Gating for sjældne poletter indlejringer', 'nl': 'Zeldzame tokens degenereren alle tokens: het verbeteren van neurale tekstgeneratie via Adaptive Gradient Gating voor zeldzame tokens embeddings', 'hr': 'Rijetki tokeni uništavaju sve tokene: poboljšavanje generacije neuronskog teksta putem adaptivne stupnjeve Gradienta za uključenje rijetkog tokena', 'de': 'Seltene Token degenerieren alle Token: Verbesserung der neuronalen Textgenerierung durch adaptives Verlaufsgating für seltene Token Einbettungen', 'id': 'Token jarang menghasilkan Semua Token: Menembak Jenerasi Teks Neural melalui Gating Gradient Adaptif untuk Embeddings Token jarang', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '희귀 표지 퇴화 모든 표지: 사다리 선택에 적응하여 희귀 표지가 박힌 신경 텍스트 생성 개선', 'tr': 'Rare Tokens DeGenerate All Tokens: Neural Text Generation via Adaptive Gradient Gating for Rare Token Embeddings', 'sw': 'Matokeo mabaya yanatengeneza Toko zote: Kuboresha Uzalishaji wa Matambo ya Kiasili kwa njia ya Kufungua kwa ajili ya Mazungumzo yanayotokana na Majungu', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Tokenat e rralla shkatërrojnë të gjitha tokenat: Përmirësimi i gjenerimit të tekstit neuronal nëpërmjet mbledhjes adaptuese të gradientëve për përfshirjet e rralla të tokenave', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Հազվադեպ նշանները քանդում են բոլոր նշանները. զարգանում են նյարդային տեքստի ստեղծումը հազվադեպ նշանների ներգրավման ադապտիվ դասավորման միջոցով', 'az': 'Daha nadir Tokens Təklərini yaradır: Neyral Metin Mətnlərini Düzəltmək üçün Adaptiv Gradient Gating vasitəsilə yaxşılaşdırır', 'bn': 'কষ্ট ট টোকেন্স সকল টোকেনের ডিজেন্ট করুন: কষ্ট ট টোকেন এমবেডিং এর মাধ্যমে নিউরেল টেক্সট জেনারেশন উন্নতি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Rijetki tokeni uništavaju sve tokene: poboljšanje generacije neuronskog teksta putem adaptivne kapije Gradienta za uključenje rijetkih tokena', 'cs': 'Vzácné žetony Degenerují všechny žetony: zlepšení generování nervového textu pomocí adaptivního gradientu pro vložení vzácných žetonů', 'ca': 'Les fitxes rares desegeneren totes les fitxes: millorar la generació de text neuronal mitjançant la recollida adaptativa de gradients per a les fitxes rares', 'et': 'Haruldased tokenid kahjustavad kõiki tokeneid: neuroteksti genereerimise parandamine haruldaste tokenite manustamise kohanduva astmelise värava kaudu', 'fi': 'Harvinaiset poletit heikentävät kaikkia poletteja: Parannetaan neurotekstin luomista mukautuvalla gradientin portilla harvinaisten polettien upotuksiin', 'sk': 'Redki žetoni propadajo vse žetone: izboljšanje ustvarjanja nevralnega besedila prek prilagodljivega gradienta za vdelavo redkih žetonov', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Rare Tokens Degenerate All Tokens: Improving Neural Text Generation via Adaptive Gradient Gating for Rare Token Embeddings', 'jv': 'Aswit Token DeGenere All Token: Ulihke Neral Text Generation ngegambar', 'he': 'טקסים נדירים משפילים את כל הטקסים: שיפור הגורלת טקסט נוירולי באמצעות גייסת מידה מתאימה למקסימות טקסים נדירות'}
{'en': 'Although current state-of-the-art Transformer-based solutions succeeded in a wide range for single-document NLP tasks, they still struggle to address multi-input tasks such as multi-document summarization. Many solutions truncate the inputs, thus ignoring potential summary-relevant contents, which is unacceptable in the medical domain where each information can be vital. Others leverage linear model approximations to apply multi-input concatenation, worsening the results because all information is considered, even if it is conflicting or noisy with respect to a shared background. Despite the importance and social impact of medicine, there are no ad-hoc solutions for multi-document summarization. For this reason, we propose a novel discriminative marginalized probabilistic method (DAMEN) trained to discriminate critical information from a cluster of topic-related medical documents and generate a multi-document summary via token probability marginalization. Results prove we outperform the previous state-of-the-art on a biomedical dataset for multi-document summarization of systematic literature reviews. Moreover, we perform extensive ablation studies to motivate the design choices and prove the importance of each module of our method.', 'pt': 'Estudos recentes determinaram que as incorporações de token aprendidas de modelos de linguagem neural em larga escala são degeneradas para serem anisotrópicas com uma forma de cone estreito. Esse fenômeno, chamado de problema de degeneração da representação, facilita o aumento da similaridade geral entre tokens embeddings que afetam negativamente o desempenho dos modelos. Embora os métodos existentes que abordam o problema de degeneração com base em observações do fenômeno desencadeado pelo problema melhorem o desempenho da geração de texto, a dinâmica de treinamento de token embeddings por trás do problema de degeneração ainda não é explorada. Neste estudo, analisamos a dinâmica de treinamento dos tokens embeddings com foco em tokens raros. Demonstramos que a parte específica do gradiente para embeddings de tokens raros é a principal causa do problema de degeneração para todos os tokens durante o estágio de treinamento. Com base na análise, propomos um novo método chamado, adaptive gradient gating (AGG). O AGG aborda o problema de degeneração ao delimitar a parte específica do gradiente para embeddings de token raros. Resultados experimentais de modelagem de linguagem, similaridade de palavras e tarefas de tradução automática verificam quantitativa e qualitativamente a eficácia do AGG.', 'ar': 'لقد حددت الدراسات الحديثة أن الزخارف الرمزية المكتسبة لنماذج اللغة العصبية واسعة النطاق قد تدهورت لتكون متباينة الخواص ذات شكل مخروطي ضيق. هذه الظاهرة ، التي تسمى مشكلة انحطاط التمثيل ، تسهل زيادة التشابه العام بين عمليات الزواج الرمزية التي تؤثر سلبًا على أداء النماذج. على الرغم من أن الأساليب الحالية التي تعالج مشكلة الانحطاط استنادًا إلى ملاحظات الظاهرة التي أحدثتها المشكلة تعمل على تحسين أداء إنشاء النص ، إلا أن ديناميكيات التدريب الخاصة بحفلات الزفاف الرمزية وراء مشكلة الانحطاط لم يتم استكشافها بعد. في هذه الدراسة ، نقوم بتحليل ديناميكيات التدريب لحفلات الزفاف المميزة مع التركيز على تضمين الرمز المميز النادر. نوضح أن الجزء المحدد من التدرج لحفلات الزفاف المميزة النادرة هو السبب الرئيسي لمشكلة الانحطاط لجميع الرموز أثناء مرحلة التدريب. بناءً على التحليل ، نقترح طريقة جديدة تسمى بوابات التدرج التكيفي (AGG). يعالج AGG مشكلة الانحطاط عن طريق بوابات الجزء المحدد من التدرج لحفلات الزفاف المميزة النادرة. النتائج التجريبية من النمذجة اللغوية ، وتشابه الكلمات ، ومهام الترجمة الآلية تحقق كمياً ونوعاً من فعالية AGG.', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования определили, что изученные токенные вложения крупномасштабных нейронных языковых моделей дегенерированы, чтобы быть анизотропными с узкоконусной формой. Это явление, называемое проблемой дегенерации представления, способствует увеличению общего сходства между вложениями токенов, которые негативно влияют на производительность моделей. Хотя существующие методы, которые решают проблему дегенерации на основе наблюдений за явлением, вызванным проблемой, улучшают производительность генерации текста, динамика обучения вложений токенов, стоящих за проблемой дегенерации, все еще не изучена. В этом исследовании мы анализируем обучающую динамику вложений токена, ориентируясь на редкое встраивание токена. Мы демонстрируем, что конкретная часть градиента для редких вложений токенов является ключевой причиной проблемы дегенерации для всех токенов на этапе обучения. Основываясь на анализе, мы предлагаем новый метод, называемый адаптивным градиентным стробированием(AGG). AGG решает проблему дегенерации путем стробирования определенной части градиента для редких вложений токенов. Экспериментальные результаты моделирования языка, сходство слов и задачи машинного перевода количественно и качественно подтверждают эффективность AGG.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、大規模な神経言語モデルの学習されたトークン埋め込みは、狭い円錐形で異方性であるように退化していることが判明しています。 表現変性問題と呼ばれるこの現象は、モデルのパフォーマンスに悪影響を及ぼすトークン埋め込み間の全体的な類似性の増加を促進します。 この問題が引き起こす現象の観察に基づいて変性問題に対処する既存の方法は、テキスト生成のパフォーマンスを向上させるが、変性問題の背後にあるトークン埋め込みのトレーニングダイナミクスについてはまだ検討されていない。 本研究では、希少なトークン埋め込みに焦点を当てたトレーニング埋め込みのダイナミクスを分析します。 レアなトークン埋め込みのためのグラデーションの特定の部分が、トレーニング段階のすべてのトークンの変性問題の主な原因であることを実証します。 分析に基づいて、適応勾配ゲーティング（ AGG ）と呼ばれる新たな方法を提案します。 AGGは、希少なトークン埋め込みのためにグラデーションの特定の部分をゲートすることによって、変性の問題に対処します。 言語モデリング、単語の類似性、および機械翻訳タスクからの実験結果は、AGGの有効性を定量的および定性的に検証する。', 'zh': '近论已定,大神经语言模形之学令牌嵌退化为狭锥各向异性。 谓之示退化,有益于负面影响者令牌销相似性。 虽有观于观退化文本成性,退化背令牌销练动力学未得探索。 于此论代币嵌,重为奇代币嵌。 臣等证希有令牌嵌梯度者特定训练所有令牌退化之要也。 论其本末,谓之自适梯度门控(AGG)新法。 AGG 以梯度者特定门控以决退化。 言建模、单词相似性、机器翻译任者实验定量定性验AGG之有效性。', 'hi': 'हाल के अध्ययनों ने निर्धारित किया है कि बड़े पैमाने पर तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल के सीखे गए टोकन एम्बेडिंग को संकीर्ण-शंकु आकार के साथ अनिसोट्रोपिक होने के लिए degenerated कर रहे हैं। यह घटना, जिसे प्रतिनिधित्व अध: पतन समस्या कहा जाता है, टोकन एम्बेडिंग के बीच समग्र समानता में वृद्धि की सुविधा प्रदान करता है जो मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को नकारात्मक रूप से प्रभावित करता है। यद्यपि समस्या द्वारा ट्रिगर की गई घटना की टिप्पणियों के आधार पर अध: पतन समस्या को संबोधित करने वाले मौजूदा तरीके पाठ पीढ़ी के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करते हैं, अपघटन समस्या के पीछे टोकन एम्बेडिंग की प्रशिक्षण गतिशीलता अभी भी पता नहीं लगाई जाती है। इस अध्ययन में, हम दुर्लभ टोकन एम्बेडिंग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने वाले टोकन एम्बेडिंग की प्रशिक्षण गतिशीलता का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि दुर्लभ टोकन एम्बेडिंग के लिए ढाल का विशिष्ट हिस्सा प्रशिक्षण चरण के दौरान सभी टोकन के लिए अध: पतन समस्या का मुख्य कारण है। विश्लेषण के आधार पर, हम एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसे अनुकूली ग्रेडिएंट गेटिंग (एजीजी) कहा जाता है। एजीजी दुर्लभ टोकन एम्बेडिंग के लिए ढाल के विशिष्ट भाग को गेटिंग करके अध: पतन समस्या को संबोधित करता है। भाषा मॉडलिंग, शब्द समानता, और मशीन अनुवाद कार्यों से प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम मात्रात्मक रूप से और गुणात्मक रूप से एजीजी की प्रभावशीलता को सत्यापित करते हैं।', 'es': 'Estudios recientes han determinado que las incorporaciones de fichas aprendidas de modelos de lenguaje neuronal a gran escala se degeneran para ser anisotrópicas con una forma de cono estrecho. Este fenómeno, llamado problema de degeneración de la representación, facilita un aumento en la similitud general entre las incrustaciones de tokens que afectan negativamente al rendimiento de los modelos. Aunque los métodos existentes que abordan el problema de la degeneración basándose en observaciones del fenómeno desencadenado por el problema mejoran el rendimiento de la generación de texto, aún no se ha explorado la dinámica de entrenamiento de incrustaciones de fichas detrás del problema de la degeneración. En este estudio, analizamos la dinámica de entrenamiento de las incrustaciones de tokens centrándonos en la incrustación de tokens poco común. Demostramos que la parte específica del gradiente de incrustaciones de tokens raras es la causa clave del problema de degeneración de todos los tokens durante la etapa de entrenamiento. Basándonos en el análisis, proponemos un método novedoso llamado compuerta de gradiente adaptativa (AGG). AGG aborda el problema de la degeneración bloqueando la parte específica del gradiente para incrustaciones de tokens poco comunes. Los resultados experimentales del modelado del lenguaje, la similitud de palabras y las tareas de traducción automática verifican cuantitativa y cualitativamente la eficacia de AGG.', 'fr': "Des études récentes ont déterminé que les intégrations de jetons apprises de modèles de langage neuronal à grande échelle sont dégénérées pour devenir anisotropes avec une forme de cône étroit. Ce phénomène, appelé problème de dégénérescence de représentation, facilite l'augmentation de la similitude globale entre les intégrations de jetons qui affectent négativement les performances des modèles. Bien que les méthodes existantes qui traitent le problème de dégénérescence basées sur les observations du phénomène déclenché par le problème améliorent les performances de la génération de texte, la dynamique d'entraînement des intégrations de jetons derrière le problème de dégénérescence n'est toujours pas explorée. Dans cette étude, nous analysons la dynamique d'entraînement des intégrations de jetons en nous concentrant sur l'intégration de jetons rares. Nous démontrons que la partie spécifique du gradient pour les incrustations de jetons rares est la cause principale du problème de dégénérescence de tous les jetons pendant la phase d'entraînement. Sur la base de cette analyse, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode appelée contrôle de gradient adaptatif (AGG). AGG résout le problème de la dégénérescence en bloquant la partie spécifique du gradient pour les incrassements de jetons rares. Les résultats expérimentaux de la modélisation linguistique, de la similitude des mots et des tâches de traduction automatique vérifient quantitativement et qualitativement l'efficacité de l'AGG.", 'ga': 'Chinn staidéir a rinneadh le déanaí go ndéantar leabú comharthaí foghlamtha na samhlacha néartheanga ar scála mór a dhíghiniú le bheith anisotrópach le cruth cúng-chóin. Éascaíonn an feiniméan seo, ar a dtugtar an fhadhb díghiniúna ionadaíochta, méadú ar an gcosúlacht iomlán idir leabaithe chomhartha a théann i bhfeidhm go diúltach ar fheidhmíocht na múnlaí. Cé go bhfeabhsaíonn na modhanna atá ann cheana féin a thugann aghaidh ar an bhfadhb díghiniúna bunaithe ar thuairimí ar an bhfeiniméan a spreag an fhadhb feidhmíocht ghiniúint an téacs, níl dinimic oiliúna na leabaithe comharthaí taobh thiar den fhadhb díghiniúna fós á iniúchadh. Sa staidéar seo, déanaimid anailís ar dhinimic oiliúna na leabaithe chomharthaí ag díriú ar leabú comharthaí neamhchoitianta. Léirímid gurb é an chuid shonrach den ghrádán le haghaidh leabú comharthaí neamhchoitianta an phríomhchúis leis an bhfadhb díghiniúna do gach comhartha le linn na céime oiliúna. Bunaithe ar an anailís, molaimid modh nua ar a dtugtar, geataí grádán oiriúnaitheach (AGG). Tugann AGG aghaidh ar an bhfadhb díghiniúna tríd an gcuid sainiúil den ghrádán a gheataí le haghaidh leabaithe comharthaí neamhchoitianta. Deimhníonn torthaí turgnamhacha ó shamhaltú teanga, cosúlacht focal, agus tascanna aistriúcháin mheaisín go cainníochtúil agus go cáilíochtúil éifeachtacht AGG.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ კვლევები განსაზღვრებულია, რომ დიდი ნეიროლური ენერალური მოდელების შესაბამისი ტექნენები განსაზღვრებულია, რომ ანიტოპოფიური იყოს ცოტა კონის ფორმაზე. ეს ფენომენი, რომელიც გამოსახულებული დეგენერაციის პრობლემა, უფრო მსგავსი სინამდვილეობაში, რომელიც მოდელების გამოსახულებას ნეგენერაციურად გამოიყენება. თუმცა პრობლემენზე გამოიყენებული პრობლემენის დაახლოებით, რომელიც ტექსტის წარმოიქმნის მუშაობას დაახლოებით, ტექსტის წარმოიქმნის განახლოების დეგენერაციის პრობლემენის შემდეგ განახლოების ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ ანალიზიარებთ ტექსენის ინბედინგიების განსწავლების დინამიკას, რომელიც კონუქტურებულია რეტალური ტექსენის ინბედინზე. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ გრადენერაციის განსაკუთრებული ნაწილი რიცხვი ტექენერაციის გასაკუთრებული პრობლემა არის ყველა ტექენერაციის გასაკუთრებული მიზეზი. ანალიზაციის ბაზაზე, ჩვენ მინდა პრომენტის მეტი, რომელიც სახელია, ადაპტიგური გრადიენტის გადატანა(AGG). AGG მისამართება დეგენერაციის პრობლემების განსაკუთრებული ნაწილი გრადენტის განსაკუთრებული ნაწილის მისამართებლად. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ენის მოდელებიდან, სიტყვების სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა და კვა', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν καθορίσει ότι οι μαθημένες ενσωμάτωσης σημάτων μεγάλων μοντέλων νευρωνικής γλώσσας έχουν εκφυλιστεί για να είναι ανισοτροπικές με σχήμα στενού κώνου. Αυτό το φαινόμενο, που ονομάζεται πρόβλημα εκφυλισμού αναπαράστασης, διευκολύνει την αύξηση της συνολικής ομοιότητας μεταξύ των ενσωμάτωσης σημάτων που επηρεάζουν αρνητικά την απόδοση των μοντέλων. Αν και οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι που αντιμετωπίζουν το πρόβλημα εκφυλισμού με βάση παρατηρήσεις του φαινομένου που προκαλείται από το πρόβλημα βελτιώνουν την απόδοση της δημιουργίας κειμένου, η εκπαιδευτική δυναμική των συμβολικών ενσωμάτωσης πίσω από το πρόβλημα εκφυλισμού εξακολουθεί να μην διερευνάται. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, αναλύουμε την εκπαιδευτική δυναμική των ενσωμάτωσης σημάτων εστιάζοντας στην σπάνια ενσωμάτωση σημάτων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι το συγκεκριμένο μέρος της κλίσης για σπάνιες ενσωμάτωσης σημάτων είναι η βασική αιτία του προβλήματος εκφυλισμού όλων των σημάτων κατά τη διάρκεια του προπονητικού σταδίου. Με βάση την ανάλυση, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο που ονομάζεται προσαρμοστική βαθμιαία Gating (AGG). Η AGG αντιμετωπίζει το πρόβλημα εκφυλισμού τοποθετώντας το συγκεκριμένο μέρος της κλίσης για σπάνιες ενσωμάτωσης σημάτων. Πειραματικά αποτελέσματα από γλωσσική μοντελοποίηση, ομοιότητα λέξεων και εργασίες μηχανικής μετάφρασης επαληθεύουν ποσοτικά και ποιοτικά την αποτελεσματικότητα της ΓΓ.', 'hu': 'A közelmúltbeli tanulmányok megállapították, hogy a nagy léptékű neurális nyelvmodellek tanult tokenbeágyazásai degenerálódnak, keskeny kúpos alakú anizotrópiává. Ez a jelenség, az úgynevezett reprezentációs degenerációs probléma, megkönnyíti a tokenbeágyazások általános hasonlóságának növekedését, amelyek negatívan befolyásolják a modellek teljesítményét. Bár a probléma által kiváltott jelenség megfigyelésén alapuló degenerációs problémát kezelő meglévő módszerek javítják a szöveggeneráció teljesítményét, a degenerációs probléma mögötti token beágyazások edzési dinamikáját még mindig nem vizsgálják. Ebben a tanulmányban elemezzük a token beágyazások edzési dinamikáját, fókuszálva a ritka token beágyazásra. Bemutatjuk, hogy a ritka tokenbeágyazások gradiensének speciális része az edzési szakasz során minden tokennél a degenerációs probléma kulcsoka. Az elemzés alapján egy új módszert javasolunk, adaptív gradient gating (AGG). Az AGG a degenerációs problémát azzal kezeli, hogy a gradiens specifikus részét átjárja a ritka token beágyazásokhoz. A nyelvmodellezés, a szóhasonlóság és a gépi fordítási feladatok kísérleti eredményei mennyiségi és minőségi szempontból igazolják az AGG hatékonyságát.', 'it': "Studi recenti hanno determinato che le incorporazioni token apprese di modelli di linguaggio neurale su larga scala sono degenerate per essere anisotropiche con una forma a cono stretto. Questo fenomeno, chiamato problema della degenerazione della rappresentazione, facilita un aumento della somiglianza complessiva tra le incorporazioni di token che influenzano negativamente le prestazioni dei modelli. Sebbene i metodi esistenti che affrontano il problema della degenerazione basati sulle osservazioni del fenomeno innescato dal problema migliorino le prestazioni della generazione del testo, le dinamiche di formazione degli embedding token dietro il problema della degenerazione non sono ancora esplorate. In questo studio analizziamo le dinamiche di allenamento degli embedding token concentrandoci sull'embedding token raro. Dimostriamo che la parte specifica del gradiente per i token rari è la causa chiave del problema di degenerazione per tutti i token durante la fase di allenamento. Sulla base dell'analisi, proponiamo un nuovo metodo chiamato, adattivo gradient gating (AGG). AGG affronta il problema della degenerazione collegando la parte specifica del gradiente per incorporazioni di token rari. I risultati sperimentali della modellazione linguistica, della somiglianza delle parole e delle attività di traduzione automatica verificano quantitativamente e qualitativamente l'efficacia di AGG.", 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikti tyrimai parodė, kad pasimokyti didelio masto neurokalbinių modelių ženklai degeneruojami taip, kad jie būtų siauro kūno formos anizotropiniai. Šis reiškinys, vadinamas reprezentacinės degeneracijos problema, padeda padidinti bendrą ženklų įterpimo panašumą, kuris neigiamai veikia modelių veiksmingumą. Nors esami metodai, kuriais sprendžiama degeneracijos problema, grindžiami problemos sukelto reiškinio stebėjimais, pagerina teksto kūrimo veiksmingumą, vis dar nėra tiriama degeneracijos problemos požymių įdėjimo mokymo dinamika. Šiame tyrime analizuojame token ų įdėjimo mokymo dinamiką, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant retam tokenų įdėjimui. Mes įrodome, kad ypatinga retųjų ženklų įdėjimo gradiento dalis yra pagrindinė degeneracijos problemos priežastis visiems ženklams mokymo etape. Remiantis analize siūlome naują metodą, vadinamą adaptaciniu gradientu gating (AGG). AGG sprendžia degeneracijos problem ą, išsklaidydama konkrečią gradiento dalį retams ženklams įdėti. Eksperimentiniai kalbų modeliavimo, žodžių panašumo ir mašinų vertimo užduočių rezultatai kiekybiškai ir kokybiškai tikrina AGG veiksmingumą.', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы зерттеулері үлкен түрлі невралдық тіл үлгілерінде үйренген тегін ендіруді анықтайды. Қалың кон пішінде анисотроп болу үшін. Бұл панель, дегенерациялық дегенерациялық мәселе деп аталады, үлгілердің істеуіне негативті әсер етілетін белгілер арасындағы жалпы ұқсастықтығын көмектеседі. Бірақ мәселе жасалған панелінің қарау мәселесіне негізделген дегенерациялау мәселесін шешу әдістері мәселесін жасауға негізделген, дегенерациялау мәселесінің артындағы таңдау динамикасы әлі іздемейді. Бұл зерттеулерде, белгілі токтен ендіру динамикасын анализирақ. Біз градиенттің ерекше бөлігін кейбір белгілер ендіру үшін дегенерациялау мәселесінің негізгі себебі дегенерациялау мәселесін көрсетеді. Анализацияның негізінде, біз романдық әдістерін, адаптификалық градиенттің gating (AGG) деп аталады. AGG дегенерациялау мәселесін кейбір белгілі белгілер үшін градиенттің нақты бөлігін сәйкестіріп береді. Тілдерді моделген эксперименталық нәтижелері, сөздердің ұқсастығы және машинаның аудару тапсырмаларының санатты және квалификациялығын тексеру.', 'ms': 'Ujian baru-baru ini telah menentukan bahawa pemindahan token belajar dari model bahasa saraf skala besar adalah degenerasi menjadi anisotropik dengan bentuk konus sempit. Fenomen ini, dipanggil masalah pencerobohan perwakilan, memudahkan peningkatan keseluruhan persamaan diantara bentuk token yang mempengaruhi negatif prestasi model. Walaupun kaedah yang wujud yang mengatasi masalah degenerasi berdasarkan pengamatan fenomena yang dipicu oleh masalah meningkatkan prestasi generasi teks, dinamika latihan penyampilan token di belakang masalah degenerasi masih belum dikeksplorasi. Dalam kajian ini, kami menganalisis dinamik latihan penyembedding token yang fokus pada penyembedding token langka. Kami menunjukkan bahawa bahagian spesifik gradien untuk penyembedding token langka adalah penyebab utama masalah degenerasi untuk semua token semasa tahap latihan. Berdasarkan analisis, kami cadangkan kaedah baru yang dipanggil, gradien adaptif gating (AGG). AGG menghadapi masalah degenerasi dengan gating bahagian spesifik gradien untuk pelengkapan token langka. Hasil percubaan dari pemodelan bahasa, persamaan perkataan, dan tugas terjemahan mesin secara kuantitatif dan kualitatif mengesahkan keefektivitas AGG.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните студии утврдија дека научените приклучувања на големи модели на невропски јазик се дегенерирани за да бидат анистропични со тесна конска форма. Овој феномен, наречен проблем со дегенерација на претставувањето, го олеснува зголемувањето на целокупната сличност помеѓу вложувањата на знаци кои негативно влијаат на перформансата на моделите. Иако постојните методи за решавање на проблемот со дегенерацијата базирани на набљудувањата на феноменот предизвикан од проблемот ја подобруваат резултатот на генерацијата на текст, динамиката на обуката на вложувањата на знаци зад проблемот со дегенерацијата сé уште не се истражува. Во оваа студија, ја анализираме динамиката на тренингот на вложувањето на знаци фокусирајќи се на ретко вложување на знаци. Демонстрираме дека специфичниот дел од градиентот за ретки вградувања на знаци е клучната причина за проблемот со дегенерацијата на сите знаци за време на фаза на тренинг. Базирано на анализата, предложуваме нов метод наречен, адаптивно градиентно gating (AGG). АГГ го решава проблемот со дегенерацијата со вклучување на специфичниот дел од градиентот за ретки вградувања на знаци. Експерименталните резултати од моделирањето на јазикот, сличноста на зборовите и задачите за машински превод квантитивно и квалитетно ја верификуваат ефикасноста на AGG.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തിടെ പഠിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന അടയാളം വലിയ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ അകത്തേക്കുള്ളതാണെന്ന് തീരുമാനിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.  ഈ സംഭവം പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം വിളിക്കുന്നു, മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവനത്തെ നേരിട്ട് പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്ന മൊ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d തുടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ നിരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലായി നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പ്രശ്നം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. പ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന അടയാളങ്ങളുടെ ട്രെയിനിന്റെ ജീവിതം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. കുറഞ്ഞ ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുടെ അകത്തേക്ക് കടക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക ഭാഗമാണെന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു അന്വേഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു എജിജി കുറഞ്ഞ ചിഹ്നം അകത്തേക്ക് കടക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഗ്രേഡിഗിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. Experimental results from language modeling, word similarity, and machine translation tasks quantitatively and qualitatively verify the effectiveness of AGG.', 'mt': 'Studji reċenti ddeterminaw li l-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-token miksuba ta’ mudelli ta’ lingwa newrali fuq skala kbira huma deġenerati biex ikunu aniżotropiċi b’forma ta’ koni dejqa. Dan il-fenomenu, imsejjaħ il-problema tad-deġenerazzjoni tar-rappreżentanza, jiffaċilita żieda fis-similarità globali bejn l-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-tokens li jaffettwaw b’mod negattiv il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli. Għalkemm il-metodi eżistenti li jindirizzaw il-problema tad-deġenerazzjoni bbażati fuq osservazzjonijiet tal-fenomenu kkawżat mill-problema jtejbu l-prestazzjoni tal-ġenerazzjoni tat-test, id-dinamika tat-taħriġ tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-tokens wara l-problema tad-deġenerazzjoni għadha mhijiex esplorata. F’dan l-istudju, nagħmlu analiżi tad-dinamika tat-taħriġ tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-tokens li tiffoka fuq l-inkorporazzjoni rari tat-tokens. Aħna nuru li l-parti speċifika tal-gradjent għall-inkorporazzjoni ta’ tokens rari hija l-kawża ewlenija tal-problema tad-deġenerazzjoni għat-tokens kollha matul l-istadju tat-taħriġ. Abbażi tal-analiżi, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid imsejjaħ gating gradjenti adattiv (AGG). AGG addresses the degeneration problem by gating the specific part of the gradient for rare token embeddings.  Riżultati esperimentali mill-mudellar tal-lingwi, ix-xejra tal-kliem, u l-kompiti tat-traduzzjoni bil-magna jivverifikaw kwantitattivament u kwalitattivament l-effettività tal-AGG.', 'no': 'Nyleg har studiane avgjort at dei lærte innbygginga av store neuralspråk-modeller er degenerert til å vera anisotropisk med ein liten kjerneforme. Denne fenomenen, kalla representasjonen for degenerasjonsproblemet, gjer det lett å øke i den generelle likheten mellom innbygginga av token som negativt påvirkar utviklinga av modelane. Selv om dei eksisterande metodane som adresserer degenerasjonsprobleten basert på observasjonar av fenomenen som utfører av problemet forbetrar utviklinga av tekstgenereringa, vert opplæringsdynamikka for innbygging av token bak degenerasjonsprobleten fortsatt ikkje utforska. I denne studien analyserer vi øvingsdynamikken av innbygginga av token som fokuserer på sjeldre innbygging av token. Vi viser at den spesifikke delen av fargeovergangen for rare token innebygging er nøkkelårsaken for degenerasjonsproblemet for alle teikn under opplæringsstaden. Basert på analysen, foreslår vi ein novelmetode kalla, adaptivt fargeoverganging (AGG). AGG adresser degenereringsproblemet ved å henta den spesifiserte delen av fargeovergangen for rare token innbygging. Eksperimentale resultat frå språk-modellering, ordsimilaritet og dataomsetjingsprogrammer kvantitativ og kvalitativ kontroller effektiviteten av AGG.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania wykazały, że nauczone osadzenia tokenów wielkoskalowych modeli języka neuronowego są zdegenerowane na anizotrop o kształcie wąskiego stożka. Zjawisko to, zwane problemem degeneracji reprezentacji, ułatwia zwiększenie ogólnego podobieństwa pomiędzy osadzeniami tokenów, które negatywnie wpływają na wydajność modeli. Chociaż istniejące metody rozwiązywania problemu degeneracji oparte na obserwacjach zjawiska wywołanego przez problem poprawiają wydajność generowania tekstu, dynamika treningowa osadzeń tokenów stojących za problemem degeneracji nadal nie została zbadana. W niniejszym badaniu analizujemy dynamikę treningową osadzeń tokenów koncentrując się na rzadkim osadzeniu tokenów. Wykazujemy, że specyficzna część gradientu dla rzadkich osadzeń tokenów jest kluczową przyczyną problemu degeneracji wszystkich tokenów na etapie treningu. Na podstawie analizy proponujemy nową metodę o nazwie adaptive gradient gating (AGG). AGG rozwiązuje problem degeneracji poprzez wprowadzenie określonej części gradientu dla rzadkich osadzeń tokenów. Wyniki eksperymentalne z modelowania językowego, podobieństwa słów oraz zadań tłumaczenia maszynowego w sposób ilościowy i jakościowy weryfikują skuteczność AGG.', 'mn': 'Саяхан судалгаанууд том хэл загварын сургалтын тодорхойлолт нь жижиг конус хэлбэртэй анизотропик болдог гэдгийг ойлгосон. Энэ үйл явдал, загварын үйл ажиллагаанд сөрөг нөлөөлдөг загварын үйл ажиллагаанд нөлөөлдөг тэмдэглэл хоорондын нийтлэг адилхан байдал нэмэгдүүлдэг. Хэдийгээр асуудал үүсгэсэн үзэгдэл дээр үндсэн энергийнхээ асуудлыг удирдах суурь арга зам нь текст үеийн үйл ажиллагааг улам сайжруулдаг ч, энергийнхээ асуудлын ард дасгал хөгжлийн дасгал хөгжлийн динамик нь хэзээ ч судал Энэ судалгаанд бид ховор тодорхойлолтуудын дасгал хөдөлгөөний динамикийг судалж байна. Бид тодорхой хэсэг нь ховор тодорхой тодорхой хэсэг нь суралцах үед бүх тодорхойлолтуудын хамгийн чухал шалтгаан юм. Шалгааны үндсэн нь бид шинэ арга хэмжээний зохицуулалт (AGG) гэж нэрлэдэг. AGG энергийн асуудлыг ховорхон тодорхойлолтын төвшин хэсгийг цуглуулж үздэг. Холын загварчлалын туршилтын үр дүнг, үг төстэй байдал, машины хөрөнгө оруулах үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг хэмжээтэй, квалификацийн ажиллагаагаар AGG-ын үр дүнг баталж байна.', 'ro': 'Studii recente au determinat că încorporările token învățate ale modelelor de limbaj neural la scară largă sunt degenerate pentru a fi anisotropice cu o formă cu conul îngust. Acest fenomen, numit problema degenerării reprezentării, facilitează o creștere a similitudinii generale dintre încorporările token care afectează negativ performanța modelelor. Deși metodele existente care abordează problema degenerării bazate pe observațiile fenomenului declanșat de problemă îmbunătățesc performanța generarii de text, dinamica de formare a încorporărilor token din spatele problemei degenerării încă nu este explorată. În acest studiu, analizăm dinamica de formare a încorporărilor token concentrându-se pe încorporarea token-urilor rare. Demonstrăm că partea specifică a gradientului pentru încorporările rare de token este cauza cheie a problemei de degenerare a tuturor jetoanelor în timpul etapei de antrenament. Pe baza analizei, propunem o metodă nouă numită, adaptive gradient gating (AGG). AGG abordează problema degenerării prin accesarea părții specifice a gradientului pentru încorporarea token-urilor rare. Rezultatele experimentale ale modelării limbii, similarității cuvintelor și sarcinilor de traducere automată verifică cantitativ și calitativ eficacitatea AGG.', 'sr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje je utvrdilo da su naučeni znakovi uključeni u velike neuralne jezičke modele degenerisani da su anisotropični sa uskim konom oblikom. Ovaj fenomen, nazvan problem degeneracije predstave, olakšava povećanje ukupne sličnosti između uključenih znakova koji negativno utiču na učinkovitost modela. Iako postojeće metode koje rješavaju problem degeneracije na osnovu promatranja fenomena koji je izazvao problem poboljšava učinkovitost generacije teksta, dinamika obuke znakova uključenja iza problema degeneracije još uvek se ne istražuje. U ovoj studiji analiziramo dinamiku obuke znakova koji se fokusiraju na rijetke uključenje znakova. Pokazujemo da je određeni deo gradjana za retke uključenje znakova ključni uzrok problema degeneracije za sve znakove tokom treninga. Na osnovu analize, predlažemo novu metodu zvanu, adaptivnu pregledu gradient a (AGG). AGG rešava problem degeneracije prikupljajući određeni deo gradienta za retke integracije znakova. Eksperimentalni rezultati iz modeliranja jezika, sličnosti riječi i zadataka za prevod mašine kvantitativno i kvalitativno potvrđuju učinkovitost AGG-a.', 'so': "Waxbarashada la soo dhowaaday ayaa go'aansaday in calaamada la bartay ay ka soo baxaan muuqashada afka neurada oo aad u weyn, si ay u noqdaan anisotropic oo u eg qaab fudud. Hadalkan waxaa looga yeedhaa dhibaatada degdegaanka, wuxuu ku caawinayaa kordhidda siman oo u dhexaysa calaamada, taasoo si negativ u saameyn ku yeelata sameynta modellada. In kastoo uu yahay qaababka joogta oo ku saabsan dhibaatada degdegaanka ku saabsan aragtida arimaha dhibaatada ka soo baxay uu kordhinayo dhamaadka qarniga qoraalka, waxbarashada waxyaabaha ka soo baxa dhibaatada degdegidda weli lama baahan doono. Waxbarashadan waxaynu ku baaraynaa cilmiga tababarida ee calaamada, kaas oo ku kalsoonaya calaamada qaaliga ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qayb gaar ah oo ka mid ah sameynta calaamada qaaliga ah waa sababta dhibaatada degdegaanka ee dhamaan calaamooyinka tababarka. Fasirka lagu saleynayo, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab saxda ah oo la yidhaahdo, habboon darafka lagu beddelo (AGG). AGG addresses the degeneration problem by gating the specific part of the gradient for rare token embeddings.  Imtixaanka waxaa ka soo baxa tusaale ahaan luuqada, hadalka isku mid ah, iyo shaqooyinka turjumaadda machine si qiyaas ah iyo si tijaab ah u xaqiijiyaa waxyaabaha AGG.", 'si': 'අලුත් පරීක්ෂණය තීර්ණා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණ භාෂා මොඩේල් එකේ ඉගෙන ගත්ත තොකෙන් ඇන්සිට්\u200dරොපික් වෙන්න බැර මේ ප්\u200dරදේශය, ප්\u200dරදේශනය අවස්ථාවය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කියලා කියලා, ප්\u200dරදේශනය අවස්ථාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ටොකෙන් ඇන්බින්ඩින්ග් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සියලු  විශ්ලේෂණයේ අධිරූපයෙන්, අපි කියන්නේ නියම විධානයක් කියලා, අනුමානික විධානයක් (AGG). AGG ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැනීමට සඳහා ග්\u200dරේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය, වචනය සමාන්\u200dයතාවය, පණිවිධාන වාර්තාවක් පරීක්ෂණයක් සහ AGG ගේ පරීක්ෂණතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනව', 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda studier har visat att de lärda symbolinbäddningarna av storskaliga neurala språkmodeller är degenererade till att vara anisotrop med en smal konform. Detta fenomen, som kallas representation degeneration problem, underlättar en ökning av den övergripande likheten mellan token inbäddningar som negativt påverkar modellernas prestanda. Även om de befintliga metoderna som tar itu med degenerationsproblemet baserat på observationer av fenomenet som utlöses av problemet förbättrar prestandan för textgenereringen, undersöks utbildningsdynamiken för token inbäddningar bakom degenerationsproblemet fortfarande inte. I denna studie analyserar vi träningsdynamiken hos token inbäddningar med fokus på sällsynta token inbäddning. Vi visar att den specifika delen av gradienten för sällsynta token inbäddningar är den viktigaste orsaken till degenerationsproblemet för alla token under träningsstadiet. Baserat på analysen föreslår vi en ny metod kallad adaptiv gradient gating (AGG). AGG tar itu med degenerationsproblemet genom att gatera den specifika delen av gradienten för sällsynta token inbäddningar. Experimentella resultat från språkmodellering, ordlikhet och maskinöversättningsuppgifter verifierar kvantitativt och kvalitativt AGG:s effektivitet.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் படிக்கப்பட்ட குறியீடுகள் பெரிய அளவு புதிய நெருக்கல் மொழி மாதிரிகளின் உள்ளிடப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை அறிவித்துள்ளார்கள் இந்த குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனையின் பிரதிநிதியான வேகம் பிரச்சனையை அழைக்கும், மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாட்டை எதிர்மறையாக பாதிக்கும் கு பிரச்சினையின் பார்வையை அடிப்படையில் தேவைப்படுத்தும் தற்போதைய முறைகளில் இருந்தாலும் உரை தலைமுறையின் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துகிறது எனினும் தேவைப் இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் பயிற்சி இயந்திரங்களை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் குறியீடு குறியீட்டு உள்ளிடும் மீது  நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதியை காட்டுக ஆராய்ச்சி அடிப்படையில், நாம் பெயரிடப்பட்ட புதிய முறைமை AGG குறிப்பிட்ட குறியீட்டு நுழைவுகளுக்கு குறிப்பிட்ட கிரேடியனின் குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதியை மாற்றி வேகமான Name', 'ur': 'اگلے مطالعہ کی تعلیم نے مقرر کی ہے کہ بڑے مطالعہ کی نئرول زبان مدلکوں کی سیکھی ٹوکنوں میں اندھیرے کی شکل کے ساتھ اندھیرے ہوئے ہیں۔ یہ روشنی، روشنی نازل ہونے کے مسئلہ کا نام ہے، ٹوکین انڈینگ کے درمیان سب سے زیادہ برابر ہے جو مدلز کے عملکرد پر نابرابر اثر دیتا ہے. اگرچہ موجود طریقے جن کی وجہ سے مسئلہ کی آزمائش پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں کہ تفسیر کے پیدا ہونے کے ذریعہ سے آزمائش کے مسئلہ کی تحقیق کرتی ہیں، تفسیر کے پیچھے ٹوکین کے پیدا ہونے کے ٹوکین کی تعلیم ڈینامیک کی تحقیق ابھی بھی نہیں کی جاتی۔ اس مطالعہ میں، ہم ٹوکنوں کی تطالعہ ڈینامیک کی تحلیل کرتے ہیں جو نادر ٹوکنوں میں مشغول ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ گریڈینٹ کی مخصوص حصہ تھوڑی ٹوکنوں کے امبرڈینگ کے لئے ہے کہ تمام ٹوکنوں کے لئے تدریس سٹیج کے موقعی تمام ٹوکینوں کے لئے ذلیل مسئلہ ہے۔ تحلیل پر بنیاد ہے، ہم ایک نوی طریقہ پیشنهاد کریں گے جس کا نام ہے، اڈپٹیٹ گریڈینٹ گٹینگ(AGG). AGG کم ٹوکنوں ایمبڈینگ کے لئے گریڈینٹ کا خاص حصہ حاصل کرنے کے ذریعہ ذلیل شدن مسئلہ کو ادرس کرتا ہے. زبان موڈلینگ، کلمات مثالی اور ماشین ترجمہ کے کاموں کی تعداد کے طور پر اور کفایت کے طور پر AGG کی فعالیت کی تصدیق کریں.', 'uz': "Yaqinda o'rganishlar, katta darajada neyrol modellarining o'rganadigan belgilar anisotropik shakli bilan qisqa shakli bo'lishi mumkin. Bu narsa, tashkilotni ajratish muammolari deb ataladi, modellarning natijasini negativ tashkilotga qo'shish mumkin. Agar muammolar ishga tushirilgan narsalarni ko'rib chiqarishga asoslangan mavjud usullar, matn generalining natijasini bajarishini bajaradi, degeneration muammolariga yordam beradigan signalning taʼminlovchi dynamikasi o'rganadi. Bu o'qituvda, biz cheksiz signal ichida o'rganishning tajriba dynamikasini aniqlamiz. Biz ko'rsatganimiz, qisqa signal kiritilgan gradientning xossa qismlari - taʼminlovchi sohalarda hamma tegnlarning eng muhim sababdir. Analysi asosida, biz taʼminlovchi gradient gating (AGG) deb nomli novel usulini tahrirlash. Name Name", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây đã xác định được việc cấy ghép tượng trưng của các mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh trên diện rộng đã thoái hóa thành dị vật với hình hình nón hẹp. Cái hiện tượng này, được gọi là vấn đề thoái hóa đại diện, giúp đỡ việc tăng khả năng tương đồng chung giữa sự nhúng giữ tượng ảnh hưởng tiêu cực đến khả năng của các mô hình. Mặc dù phương pháp có sẵn để giải quyết vấn đề thoái hóa dựa trên quan sát của hiện tượng gây ra bởi vấn đề cải thiện hiệu suất của sản xuất văn bản, nhưng vẫn chưa được nghiên cứu về tính chất huấn luyện của sự nhúng giữ biểu đồ đằng sau vấn đề thoái hóa. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi phân tích tính chất huấn luyện của sự ghép hình tượng lưu ý tập trung vào sự nhúng tay. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng chi tiết cụ thể của dốc cho sự nhúng vào tượng trưng hiếm là nguyên nhân chính của vấn đề thoái hóa của mọi vật lưu trong giai đoạn huấn luyện. Dựa trên phân tích, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới gọi là, có dốc thích nghi (AG). AGRA đã giải quyết vấn đề thoái hóa bằng cách chọn phần đặc trưng của dốc cho sự nhúng vào ít tượng trưng. Kết quả thử nghiệm từ việc tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ, từ giống nhau, và các công việc dịch chuyển máy về mặt lượng và chất lượng xác minh độ hiệu quả của AG.', 'bg': 'Последни проучвания са установили, че научените символни вграждания на широкомащабни невронни езикови модели са дегенерирани да бъдат анизотропни с тясна конусна форма. Това явление, наречено проблем с дегенерацията на представянето, улеснява увеличаването на общата прилика между вгражданията на символи, които оказват отрицателно влияние върху ефективността на моделите. Въпреки че съществуващите методи, които решават проблема с дегенерацията въз основа на наблюдения на явлението, предизвикано от проблема, подобряват ефективността на генерирането на текст, тренировъчната динамика на вграждането на символи зад проблема с дегенерацията все още не е проучена. В настоящото проучване анализираме тренировъчната динамика на вграждането на символи с фокус върху вграждането на редки символи. Ние демонстрираме, че специфичната част от градиента за редки вграждания символи е ключова причина за проблема с дегенерацията на всички символи по време на тренировъчния етап. Въз основа на анализа предлагаме нов метод, наречен адаптивен градиентен гейтинг (АГГ). АГГ решава проблема с дегенерацията чрез свързване на специфичната част от градиента за редки вграждания на символи. Експерименталните резултати от езиково моделиране, сходство с думи и задачи за машинен превод количествено и качествено проверяват ефективността на АГГ.', 'hr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje utvrdilo je da su učeni znakovi uključeni u velike neuralne jezičke modele degenerirani za anisotropiju s uskim konom oblikom. Ovaj fenomen, nazvan problem degeneracije predstave, olakšava povećanje ukupne sličnosti između ugrađenja znakova koji negativno utječe na učinkovitost modela. Iako postojeće metode koje rješavaju problem degeneracije na temelju promatranja fenomena koji je izazvao problem poboljšava učinkovitost generacije teksta, dinamika obuke znakova uključenja iza problema degeneracije još uvijek se ne istražuje. U ovom ispitivanju analiziramo dinamiku obuke znakova koji se fokusiraju na rijetke uključenje znakova. Pokazujemo da je određeni dio gradienta za rijetke uključenje znakova ključni uzrok problema degeneracije za sve znakove tijekom treninga. Na temelju analize, predlažemo novu metodu koja se zove prilagođavajući pregled gradient a (AGG). AGG rješava problem degeneracije prikupljajući određeni dio gradienta za rijetke uključenje znakova. Eksperimentalni rezultati iz modeliranja jezika, sličnosti riječi i zadataka za prevod strojeva kvantitativno i kvalitativno potvrđuju učinkovitost AGG-a.', 'nl': 'Recente studies hebben aangetoond dat de geleerde token embeddingen van grootschalige neurale taalmodellen gedegenereerd zijn om anisotroop te zijn met een smalle kegelvorm. Dit fenomeen, genaamd het representatie degeneratie probleem, vergemakkelijkt een toename van de algemene gelijkenis tussen token embeddings die de prestaties van de modellen negatief beïnvloeden. Hoewel de bestaande methoden die het degeneratieprobleem aanpakken gebaseerd op observaties van het fenomeen veroorzaakt door het probleem de prestaties van de tekstgeneratie verbeteren, wordt de trainingsdynamiek van token embeddings achter het degeneratieprobleem nog steeds niet onderzocht. In dit onderzoek analyseren we de trainingsdynamiek van de token embeddings met de nadruk op zeldzame token embedding. We tonen aan dat het specifieke deel van de gradiënt voor zeldzame token embeddings de belangrijkste oorzaak is van het degeneratieprobleem voor alle tokens tijdens de trainingsfase. Op basis van de analyse stellen we een nieuwe methode voor, Adaptive Gradient Gating (AGG). AGG pakt het degeneratieprobleem aan door het specifieke deel van de gradiënt te gaten voor zeldzame token embeddings. Experimentele resultaten van taalmodellering, woordgelijkenis en machinevertaaltaken verifiëren kwantitatief en kwalitatief de effectiviteit van AGG.', 'de': 'Neuere Studien haben ergeben, dass die erlernten Token-Einbettungen von großskaligen neuronalen Sprachmodellen zu anisotropen mit einer schmalen Kegelform degeneriert sind. Dieses Phänomen, das als Repräsentationsdegenerationsproblem bezeichnet wird, ermöglicht eine Zunahme der allgemeinen Ähnlichkeit zwischen Token-Einbettungen, die sich negativ auf die Leistung der Modelle auswirken. Obwohl die bestehenden Methoden, die auf Beobachtungen des durch das Problem ausgelösten Phänomens beruhen, die Leistung der Textgenerierung verbessern, die Trainingsdynamik von Token-Einbettungen hinter dem Degenerationsproblem noch nicht erforscht sind. In dieser Studie analysieren wir die Trainingsdynamik der Token-Einbettungen mit Fokus auf seltene Token-Einbettungen. Wir zeigen, dass der spezifische Teil des Gradienten für seltene Token-Einbettungen die Hauptursache für das Degenerationsproblem für alle Token während der Trainingsphase ist. Basierend auf der Analyse schlagen wir eine neue Methode vor, die Adaptive Gradient Gating (AGG) genannt wird. AGG löst das Degenerationsproblem durch Gating des spezifischen Teils des Gradienten für seltene Token-Einbettungen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse aus Sprachmodellierung, Wortähnlichkeit und maschinellen Übersetzungsaufgaben belegen quantitativ und qualitativ die Wirksamkeit von AGG.', 'da': 'Nylige undersøgelser har fastslået, at de lærte token-indlejringer af store neurale sprogmodeller er degenereret til at være anisotrop med en smal kegle form. Dette fænomen, kaldet repræsentation degeneration problem, letter en stigning i den samlede lighed mellem token embeddings, der påvirker modellernes ydeevne negativt. Selv om de eksisterende metoder, der løser degenerationsproblemet baseret på observationer af det fænomen, der udløses af problemet, forbedrer tekstgenereringens ydeevne, er træningsdynamikken i token-indlejringer bag degenerationsproblemet stadig ikke undersøgt. I dette studie analyserer vi træningsdynamikken i token embeddings med fokus på sjælden token embedding. Vi demonstrerer, at den specifikke del af gradienten for sjældne token-indlejringer er den vigtigste årsag til degenerationsproblemet for alle tokens under træningsfasen. Baseret på analysen foreslår vi en ny metode kaldet adaptiv gradient gating (AGG). AGG løser degenerationsproblemet ved at gate den specifikke del af gradienten til sjældne token-indlejringer. Eksperimentelle resultater fra sprogmodellering, ordlighed og maskinoversættelsesopgaver kontrollerer kvantitativt og kvalitativt effektiviteten af AGG.', 'id': 'Studi-studi baru-baru ini telah menentukan bahwa pemindahan token belajar dari model bahasa saraf skala besar telah degenerasi menjadi anisotropi dengan bentuk cone sempit. Fenomen ini, yang disebut masalah degenerasi representation, memfasilitasi peningkatan keseluruhan persamaan antara bentuk token yang mempengaruhi negatif prestasi model. Meskipun metode yang ada yang mengatasi masalah degenerasi berdasarkan pengamatan fenomena yang dipicu oleh masalah memperbaiki prestasi generasi teks, dinamika pelatihan token embedding di balik masalah degenerasi masih belum dikeksplorasi. Dalam studi ini, kami menganalisis dinamika pelatihan dari penyampilan token fokus pada penyampilan token langka. We demonstrate that the specific part of the gradient for rare token embeddings is the key cause of the degeneration problem for all tokens during training stage.  Based on the analysis, we propose a novel method called, adaptive gradient gating(AGG).  AGG mengatasi masalah degenerasi dengan menggali bagian spesifik dari gradien untuk bentuk token langka. Hasil eksperimental dari model bahasa, persamaan kata, dan tugas terjemahan mesin kuantitatif dan kualitatif memverifikasi efektivitas AGG.', 'fa': 'مطالعه های اخیر تصمیم گرفته اند که پیدا کردن نشانه های یاد گرفته شده از مدل های زبان عصبی بسیار بزرگ به عنوان یک شکل کان تنگ آینزوروپیک نابود می شوند. این پدیده، به نام مشکل تغییر انرژی نمایش، افزایش شباهت عمومی بین پیوند نشانه\u200cهای معجزه\u200cای که منفی بر عملکرد مدل\u200cها تأثیر می\u200cدهند، آسان می\u200cکند. اگرچه روش\u200cهای موجود که مشکل نابودی را بر اساس مشاهده\u200cهای پدیده\u200cای که توسط مشکل باعث شده است، عملکرد نسل متن را بهتر می\u200cکند، دینامیک آموزش آموزش نشانه\u200cها پشت مشکل نابودی هنوز تحقیق نمی\u200cشوند. در این مطالعه، ما دینامیک تمرین\u200cها را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که روی پیوند نشانه\u200cهای نادر تمرکز می\u200cکنند. ما نشان می دهیم که بخشی خاصی از گرادن برای پیوند نشانه های نادر دلیل کلید مشکل نابودی برای همه نشانه ها در مرحله آموزش است. بر اساس تحلیل، ما یک روش رمانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم به نام Gating Gradient Adaptive (AGG). AGG مشکل نابودی را با جمع کردن بخش خاصی از گرادیند برای پیوند نشانه\u200cهای نادر نشان می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای از مدل\u200cسازی زبان، شبیه\u200cسازی کلمات و کار\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cسازی ماشین\u200cها به اندازه\u200cی اندازه\u200cگیری و کیفیت عملکرد AGG را ثابت می\u200cکنند.', 'ko': '최근 연구에 따르면 대규모 신경 언어 모델의 학습 표기 삽입은 좁은 원추형의 각방향 이성으로 퇴화되었다.이런 현상을 표징 퇴화 문제라고 하는데 표기 삽입 간의 전체적인 유사성을 증가시켜 모델의 성능에 부정적인 영향을 미친다.비록 기존의 문제로 인한 현상에 대한 관찰을 바탕으로 퇴화 문제를 해결하는 방법은 텍스트 생성의 성능을 향상시켰지만 퇴화 문제 뒤에 표시가 박힌 훈련 동태는 여전히 탐색되지 않았다.이 연구에서 우리는 영패 삽입의 훈련 동태를 분석했는데 중점은 보기 드문 영패 삽입이다.우리는 보기 드문 영패가 사다리에 박힌 특정 부분이 훈련 단계의 모든 영패 퇴화 문제의 관건적인 원인임을 증명했다.이를 바탕으로 AGG(Adaptive Granding Group)라는 새로운 방법을 제시했습니다.AGG는 희귀한 태그가 포함된 특정 사다리 부분을 선택하여 퇴화 문제를 해결합니다.언어 모델링, 단어 유사성과 기계 번역 임무의 실험 결과는 정량과 정성에서 AGG의 유효성을 검증했다.', 'sw': 'Tafiti za hivi karibuni zimeamua kuwa ishara zilizojifunza zinazoingia katika mifano ya lugha kubwa ya neurali zinaongezeka kuwa sura yenye sura ndogo. Hali hii, iliita tatizo la kuongezeka kwa kiwango cha degeneration, linasaidia kuongezeka kwa ujumla wa usawa kati ya viungo vya ishara ambavyo vinasababisha utendaji wa mifano. Ingawa njia zilizopo zinazozungumzia tatizo la hali ya hewa kwa kutumia mtazamo wa hali hii iliyotolewa na tatizo linaboresha ufanisi wa kizazi cha maandishi, mbinu za mafunzo zinazoingia nyuma ya matatizo ya mazingira bado hazijatambuliwa. Katika utafiti huu, tunachambua nguvu za mafunzo ya alama zinazoingia kwenye alama chache zinazoingia. Tunaonyesha kuwa sehemu maalum ya msingi wa ishara nadra za kuingia ni sababu ya tatizo la mazungumzo kwa ishara zote wakati wa mafunzo. Kutokana na uchambuzi, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya inayoitwa, yenye uchunguzi mkali (AGG). AGG anaelezea tatizo la mazungumzo kwa kuingia sehemu maalum ya shambulio hilo kwa alama chache za kuingia. Matokeo ya majaribio yanatokana na mifano ya lugha, maneno yanafanana na kazi za kutafsiri mashine kwa kiasi kikubwa na kinathibitisha ufanisi wa AGG.', 'sq': 'Studimet e fundit kanë përcaktuar se përfshirjet e mësuara të shenjave të modeleve në shkallë të madhe të gjuhës nervore janë të degeneruara për të qenë anisotropike me një formë të ngushtë-koni. Ky fenomen, i quajtur problemi i degenerimit të përfaqësimit, lehtëson një rritje në ngjashmërinë e përgjithshme midis përfshirjeve të shenjave që ndikojnë negativisht në performancën e modeleve. Megjithëse metodat ekzistuese që trajtojnë problemin e degenerimit bazuar në vëzhgimet e fenomenit të shkaktuar nga problemi përmirësojnë performancën e gjeneratës së tekstit, dinamika e trajnimit e përfshirjeve të shenjave pas problemit të degenerimit ende nuk janë shqyrtuar. Në këtë studim, ne analizojmë dinamikën e trajnimit të përfshirjeve të shenjave duke u përqëndruar në përfshirjen e shenjave të rralla. Ne demonstrojmë se pjesa e veçantë e gradientit për përfshirjet e rralla të tokave është shkaku kyç i problemit të degenerimit për të gjitha tokat gjatë fazës së stërvitjes. Bazuar në analizën, ne propozojmë një metodë të re të quajtur, gradienti adaptues gating (AGG). AGG trajton problemin e degenerimit duke aktivizuar pjesën specifike të gradientit për përfshirje të rralla token. Experimental results from language modeling, word similarity, and machine translation tasks quantitatively and qualitatively verify the effectiveness of AGG.', 'tr': "Ýakyndaky araştyrmalar, uly ölçekli neural dil modelleriniň içinden öwrenen token elementleriniň azak-koni şeklinde anisotropik bolmagyny kesgitlendi. Bu fenomen, gösterim degenerasyon sorunu adlandırır, modellerin eserleşmesine etkilendirilmesini kolaylaştırır. Ýekerjek meselesine daýanýan öň bar yöntemler meselelerin gözlemelerine daýanýar bolsa hem mesele üçin metin döredijileriniň eserleşmesini gowulaýar, degenerasyň meseleleriniň arkasynda token kömekleşmeleriň dinamiky entägem gözlemeýär. Bu aramda, token kömekleriniň eğitim dinamiklerini nadir token düzümlenmesine üns berýäris. Ýagtym taýýarlamak üçin gradient hasaplanyşynyň belli bölegi beýleki işaretlerde degenerasyň meselesiniň esasy sebäbi bolandygyny görkezýäris. Analyzanyň üstüne görä, biz taýýarlanç çykyş(AGG) adlanýan bir roman yöntemi teklip edýäris. name Dil modellendirmeginiň, sözlerin meňzeşlikleriniň we maşynyň terjime etmekleriniň netijesi AGG'yň etkinligini barlaň.", 'af': "Onlangse studie het bepaal dat die geleerde token inbettings van groot- skaal neurale taal modelles is degenereer om anisotropies te wees met 'n sterk- kone vorm. Hierdie fenomen, die voorstelling degenerasie probleem genoem, maak 'n vergroot vergroting in die hele gelykenis tussen token inbettings wat negatief effekteer die prestasie van die modele. Alhoewel die bestaande metodes wat die degenerasie-probleem met die opmerking van die fenomen wat deur die probleem uitgevoer is, verbeter die prestasie van die teks-genereering, word die opmerking dynamiek van token-inbettings agter die degenerasie-probleem nog nie uitgevra nie. In hierdie studie, ons analyseer die onderwerking dynamiek van die token inbettings wat fokus op selfde token inbetting. Ons wys dat die spesifieke deel van die gradient vir rare token inbettings is die sleutel oorsaak van die degenerasie probleem vir alle tekens tydens onderwerp stadium. Op die analiseer, voorstel ons 'n roman metode genoem, adaptief gradient gating (AGG). AGG adresse die degenerasie probleem deur die spesifieke deel van die gradiente te verskaf vir selfde token inbêring. Eksperimentale resultate van taal modellering, woord gelykbaarheid en masjien vertaling opdragte kvantitatiewe en kwaliteit bevestig die effektiviteit van AGG.", 'hy': 'Վերջերս ուսումնասիրությունները որոշեցին, որ մեծ մակարդակի նյարդային լեզվի մոդելների ուսումնասիրված նշանները դառնում են անիզոտրոպիկ, փոքր կոնի ձևով: Այս երևույթը, որը կոչվում է ներկայացման դեգեներացման խնդիր, օգնում է աճել նշանների ներդրման ընդհանուր նմանությունը, որը բացասական ազդում է մոդելների արտադրողության վրա: Չնայած, որ գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները, որոնք լուծում են դեգեներացիայի խնդիրը, հիմնված խնդրի կողմից առաջացած ֆենոմենի դիտարկումների վրա, բարելավում են տեքստի սերունդի արտադրողականությունը, դեռևս չեն ուսումնասիրում դեգեներացիայի խնդիրը հետևում Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք վերլուծում ենք նշանների ներդրման ուսումնասիրության դինամիկան, կենտրոնացնելով հազվադեպ նշանների ներդրման վրա: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հազվադեպ նշանների ներդրման դասավորման հատուկ մասը դեգեներացիայի խնդիրների հիմնական պատճառն է բոլոր նշանների համար վարժման ժամանակ: Հաշվի առնելով վերլուծության վրա, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ, որը կոչվում է ադապտիվ ադապտիվ ագրիցիոն գետինգ: ԱԳԳ-ը լուծում է դեգեներացիայի խնդիրը՝ հազվադեպ նշանների ներգրավման դասավորման հատուկ մասը միացնելով: Լեզու մոդելավորման, բառի նմանության և մեքենային թարգմանման խնդիրների փորձարկման արդյունքները քանակական և որակավոր կերպ ստուգում են ԱԳԳ-ի արդյունավետությունը:', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি গবেষণা নির্ধারণ করেছে যে বিশাল স্কেলের নিউরাল ভাষার মডেলের শিক্ষিত প্রতীক বিশাল চিহ্নের বিভিন্ন প্রক্রিয়া স্বল্প কন এই বিষয়টি প্রতিনিধিত্বের ডেজিজেন্টেশনের সমস্যা বলে দিয়েছে, প্রতিনিধিত্বের সমস্যাকে সাধারণ প্রতিষ্ঠানের মধ্যে একাত্মতা বৃদ্ধি করে দে যদিও বিদ্রোহের সমস্যার উপর ভিত্তিতে বিস্ফোরণের সমস্যার বিষয়টি নিয়ে আলোচনা করা বর্তমান পদ্ধতি যা টেক্সট প্রজন্মের প্রজন্মের প্রভাব বিস্তার করে, তারপরেও ডিজেজেরেশন এই গবেষণায় আমরা প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণের ধারণা বিশ্লেষণ করি যে চিহ্ন প্রবেশ করা হয়েছে তার প্রতি বিশ্লেষণ করা হয়েছে দুর্লভা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রশিক্ষণ পর্যন্ত প্রশিক্ষণের সকল প্রতীকের জন্য ড্রেজেরেশন সমস্যার প্রধান অংশ। বিশ্লেষণের ভিত্তিতে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যাকে নাম দেওয়া হয়েছে, যার নাম দেওয়া হয়েছে, যার মাধ্যমে স্ব এজিজি দ্রুত চিহ্নিত প্রবেশের জন্য গ্রেডিয়েন্টের নির্দিষ্ট অংশ গ্রেডিয়েন্ডেশন সমস্যার কথা বলেছেন। ভাষার মডেলিং, শব্দ এবং মেশিন অনুবাদ কর্মসূচির পরীক্ষার ফলাফল যথাযথ পরিমাণ এবং এজিজির কার্যক্রম পরীক্ষা করা হয়।', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ትምህርት ተማርተዋል፣ የታመነ ምልክት ትልቅ የናውራዊ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በኩል አናስቶሮፕ ለመሆን እንደተጨነቀ አረጋገጠ፡፡ ይህም አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በዓይነቱ ውስጥ በዓይነቱ ክፍል በሞዴሎቹ ውጤት ላይ የሚያስጨንቅ ጥያቄን ያበረታል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በመከራው የተነሳውን የጽሑፍ ትውልድ ማድረግ የሚያሳድገውን የአስቸጋሪነቱን ጉዳይ በመጠቀም የሚችሉትን ሥርዓት ቢሆንም፣ ከግንኙነቱ መከራ በኋላ የሚያስፈልገውን የምልክት ጥያቄ መግለጫ ገና አይመረመርም፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የግንኙነቱ አካባቢ ግንኙነትን እናስተምር፡፡ We demonstrate that the specific part of the gradient for rare token embeddings is the key cause of the degeneration problem for all tokens during training stage.  በተመሳሳይ ላይ፣ አቀማመጥ አቀማመጥ (AGG) AGG የነጥብ ምልክት ማውጣት የተለየውን የግራጌውን ክፍል በመጠቀም የሚያስጨምረው ችግር አግኝቷል፡፡ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ፣ ቃላት ብጤት እና የመሳሳይ ትርጉም ስርዓቶች በቁጥር እና የAGG ውጤት በሚያረጋግጥ እና በሚያስተካክሉ ነው፡፡', 'az': "Son təcrübələrin çox ölçülü nöral dil modellərinin öyrəndiyi token içərisində aniotropik olması üçün dəyişdirilmişdir. Bu fenomen, göstəricisi degenerasiya problemi adlandırır, modellərin performansını negativ təsir edən token inbinglərin arasındakı bütün bənzərini artırar. Əgər problemin başladığı fenomenin gözləmələrinə dayanan degenerasiya problemini çəkən metodlar mətn nəslinin performansını yaxşılaşdırmasına rağmen, degenerasiya probleminin arkasındaki token inşallarının təhsil dinamiki hələ də keşfedilməz. Bu təhsil içində, bəzək token inbinglərinin təhsil dinamikini analiz edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, qüdrətin müxtəlif möcüzələr içərisində müəyyən möcüzələr üçün bütün möcüzələr üçün degenerasiya probleminin açarlı səbəbi olduğunu göstərir. Analiziyə baxmayaraq, biz yeni metod təklif edirik, adaptiv gradient gating(AGG). AGG sıxıntılı token içərisində səviyyənin müəyyən bir parçasını toplayaraq degenerasiya problemini çəkir. Dil modellərindən, sözlərin bənzəriliyindən və maşın tercümə işlərindən müəyyən edilən təcrübə sonuçları kvantitatlı və qabilitatlı AGG'nin etkinliğini təsdiqləyin.", 'bs': 'Nedavno ispitivanje su utvrdile da su učeni znakovi uključeni u velike neuralne jezičke modele degenerirani da su anisotropični sa uskim konom oblikom. Ovaj fenomen, koji se zove problem degeneracije predstave, olakšava povećanje ukupne sličnosti između uključenih znakova koji negativno utiču na učinkovitost modela. Iako postojeće metode koje rješavaju problem degeneracije na temelju promatranja fenomena koji je izazvao problem poboljšavaju učinkovitost generacije teksta, dinamika obuke znakova ugrađenja iza problema degeneracije još uvijek se ne istražuje. U ovoj studiji analiziramo dinamiku obuke znakova ugrađenja fokusiranog na rijetke ugrađenje znakova. Pokazujemo da je specifičan deo gradienta za rijetke znakove ugrađenje ključni uzrok problema degeneracije za sve znakove tijekom treninga. Na temelju analize, predlažemo novu metodu koja se zove adaptivni pregled gradient a (AGG). AGG rješava problem degeneracije prikupljajući određeni dio gradienta za rijetke uključenje znakova. Eksperimentalni rezultati iz modeliranja jezika, sličnosti riječi i zadataka za prevod mašine kvantitativno i kvalitativno potvrđuju učinkovitost AGG-a.', 'ca': "Els estudis recents han determinat que les incorporacions de fitxes aprengutes de models de llenguatge neural a gran escala estan degenerades per ser anisòtropes amb forma de còn estret. Aquest fenomen, anomenat el problema de la degeneració de la representació, facilita un augment de la similitud global entre les incorporacions de fitxes que afecten negativament el rendiment dels models. Tot i que els mètodes existents que aborden el problema de la degeneració basats en observacions del fenomen desencadenat pel problema millora el rendiment de la generació de textos, encara no s'estudien la dinàmica d'entrenament de les fitxes enrere del problema de la degeneració. En aquest estudi, analitzem la dinàmica d'entrenament de l'incorporació de fitxes centrant-nos en l'incorporació de fitxes rares. We demonstrate that the specific part of the gradient for rare token embeddings is the key cause of the degeneration problem for all tokens during training stage.  Sobre la base de l'anàlisi, proposem un mètode nou anomenat gating de gradient adaptatiu (AGG). AGG aborda el problema de la degeneració generant la part específica del gradient per incorporar fitxes rares. Els resultats experimentals de la modelació del llenguatge, la similitud de paraules i les tasques de traducció màquina verifiquen quantitativament i qualitativament l'eficacia de AGG.", 'cs': 'Nedávné studie zjistily, že naučené vkládání tokenů rozsáhlých neuronových jazykových modelů jsou degenerovány na anizotropní s úzkým kuželovým tvarem. Tento jev, nazývaný problém reprezentace degenerace, usnadňuje zvýšení celkové podobnosti mezi tokenovými vloženími, které negativně ovlivňují výkon modelů. Ačkoli existující metody řešení problému degenerace založené na pozorování fenoménu spouštěného problémem zlepšují výkonnost generování textu, tréninková dynamika vkládání tokenů za problémem degenerace stále nejsou zkoumána. V této studii analyzujeme tréninkovou dynamiku vkládání tokenů se zaměřením na vzácné vložení tokenů. Dokazujeme, že specifická část gradientu pro vzácné vložení tokenů je klíčovou příčinou degeneračního problému u všech tokenů během tréninkové fáze. Na základě analýzy navrhujeme novou metodu nazvanou Adaptive Gradient Gating (AGG). AGG řeší problém degenerace zadáním specifické části gradientu pro vzácné vložení tokenů. Experimentální výsledky jazykového modelování, podobnosti slov a strojového překladu kvantitativně a kvalitativně ověřují efektivitu AGG.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että suurten neurokielimallien opitut token-upotukset ovat rappeutuneet anisotrooppisiksi kapean kartion muotoisiksi. Tämä ilmiö, jota kutsutaan edustuksen rappeutumisongelmaksi, helpottaa mallien suorituskykyyn negatiivisesti vaikuttavien token-upotusten yleistä samankaltaisuutta. Vaikka nykyiset menetelmät, joilla puututaan rappeutumisongelmaan ongelman laukaisevan ilmiön havaintojen perusteella, parantavat tekstin tuottamisen suorituskykyä, rappeutumisongelman taustalla olevien token-upotusten harjoitusdynamiikkaa ei vielä tutkita. Tässä tutkimuksessa analysoimme token-upotusten harjoitusdynamiikkaa keskittyen harvinaisiin token-upotuksiin. Osoitamme, että harvinaisten merkkien upottamisen gradientin erityinen osa on tärkein syy kaikkien merkkien rappeutumisongelmaan harjoitteluvaiheessa. Analyysin pohjalta ehdotamme uutta menetelmää nimeltä adaptive gradient gating (AGG). AGG käsittelee rappeutumisongelmaa käyttämällä gradientin tiettyä osaa harvinaisten merkkien upottamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset kielimallinnuksesta, sanasamankaltaisuudesta ja konekäännöstehtävistä vahvistavat kvantitatiivisesti ja laadullisesti AGG:n tehokkuuden.', 'et': 'Hiljutised uuringud on kindlaks teinud, et suuremahuliste närvikeele mudelite õppitud märgid on taandunud kitsa koonuse kujuga anisotroopseteks. See nähtus, mida nimetatakse esinduse degeneratsiooni probleemiks, aitab suurendada üldist sarnasust märkide manustamise vahel, mis mõjutavad negatiivselt mudelite jõudlust. Kuigi olemasolevad meetodid, mis käsitlevad degeneratsiooniprobleemi, mis põhinevad probleemi käivitatud nähtuse vaatlustel, parandavad tekstigeneratsiooni tulemuslikkust, ei ole degeneratsiooniprobleemi taga olevate märkide koolitusdünaamikat siiani uuritud. Käesolevas uuringus analüüsime märkide manustamise treeningdünaamikat, keskendudes haruldasele märkide manustamisele. Näitame, et haruldaste märkide manustamise gradienti konkreetne osa on kõigi märkide degeneratsiooniprobleemi peamine põhjus treeningstaadiumis. Analüüsi põhjal pakume välja uue meetodi, mida nimetatakse adaptiivseks gradientväravaks (AGG). AGG lahendab degeneratsiooniprobleemi, liigutades haruldaste märkide manustamiseks gradienti konkreetse osa. Keele modelleerimise, sõna sarnasuse ja masintõlke ülesannete eksperimentaalsed tulemused kontrollivad kvantitatiivselt ja kvalitatiivselt AGG efektiivsust.', 'jv': 'text-box-mode Genjer-menehi iki, iso nggambar kelas representasi kesemplak dejane, iso nggolo nggawe gerakan kelas ning sampeyan ingkang sampeyan ingkang token sing bisa pasar-pasar iki bakal ngelarane operasi model. Genjer-genjer saiki sistem sing isih perusahaan kelas kuwi nggawe gerambut perusahaan winih sing bisa diutag sing nggawe gerambut nggawe kesempatan kanggo masalah kelas teks, dynamics nggawe gerambut sing token sing bakal terus sabên kelas Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné ranjelasno dynamics atualizasi ingkang token embedding, ndheke nggawe barang gambar token. Video basad on the testing, we proposal a new method used, Adjustable gradient gating(ARGG). name Rejaleng nggawe langkung model, gambar nggambar uwong, lan tarjamahan pangan anyar tentang karo kalitas apik nggunakake sing nggawe barang ARGG.', 'sk': 'Nedavne študije so ugotovile, da so naučene vgradnje žetonov obsežnih nevronskih jezikovnih modelov degenerirane v anizotropno obliko ozkega stožca. Ta pojav, imenovan problem degeneracije reprezentacije, omogoča povečanje splošne podobnosti med vdelavami žetonov, ki negativno vplivajo na zmogljivost modelov. Čeprav obstoječe metode, ki obravnavajo problem degeneracije na podlagi opazovanj pojava, ki ga sproži problem, izboljšujejo učinkovitost generiranja besedila, dinamika treninga vgradnje žetonov za problem degeneracije še vedno ni raziskana. V tej študiji analiziramo dinamiko treninga vdelav žetonov s poudarkom na redki vdelavi žetonov. Dokazujemo, da je specifični del gradienta za redke vdelave žetonov ključni vzrok težave z degeneracijo vseh žetonov med fazo vadbe. Na podlagi analize predlagamo novo metodo, imenovano adaptive gradient gating (AGG). AGG obravnava problem degeneracije tako, da določi določen del gradienta za redke vdelave žetonov. Eksperimentalni rezultati jezikovnega modeliranja, podobnosti besed in strojnega prevajanja kvantitativno in kvalitativno preverjajo učinkovitost AGG.', 'ha': "A yanzu-karatun na ƙayyade cewa, an sanar da alama masu cikin misalin harshen neural masu girma, za'a yi sauri da su zama anisostropic da wani tsari mai ƙaranci. Wannan abu, ana kiran matabbatar da shirin gaugãwa, yana da sauƙin ya ƙara wa jumla da daidaita tsakanin ayuka da ke cikin ayuka da negative ke yi amfani da aikin ayuka. Ingawa da shirin da ke gabatar da ta zama masu husũma ga haramtar da mazaɓa ta wajen ƙaranci ga mazaɓan matsayin, amma, ba za'a nẽmi hanyoyin ayuka da ke ƙara bayan matabbatar da za'a bada ba. A cikin wannan lõkaci, Munã anayya da idãnun da ke cikin shirin ayuka da ke cikin zura, ana yi makini da alama masu sauri. Tuna nũna cewa rabin radiradiradin da aka shigar da shi kaɗan, shi ne matsayin matsayin wa matsayin da za'a yi saurãre wa matsayin haraka wa duk ãyoyin da aka yi wa lõkaci. Basan da aka yi anadi, za'a buƙata wani hanyor node wanda ake kallo, mai adapti ga getin giya (AGG). @ info Matarin jarraba daga misalin harshe, da misalin maganar da kuma fassarori na mashine mai ƙaddara da gwargwadon kuma yana tabbatar da aikin AGG.", 'he': 'מחקרים האחרונים קבעו שהסימנים הלמודים של דוגמני שפת עצבית במידה גדולה משתגעים להיות אניסטרופיים עם צורה קונה צרה. התופעה הזו, שנקראת בעיית התפרצות, מקדימה את הגידול של הדמיון הכללי בין התכניות של סימנים שמשפיעות שלילית על ביצועים של הדוגמנים. למרות שהשיטות הנוכחיות שמטפלות בבעיה של השמירה בהתבסס על תצפיות של התופעה שהופעה על ידי הבעיה משפר את ההפעלה של דור הטקסט, דינמיקת האימון של התקפים של סימנים מאחורי הבעיה של השמירה עדיין לא נחקרת. במחקר הזה, אנו מנתחים את דינמיקת האימונים של התקפים של סימנים מתמקדים בתקפים של סימנים נדירים. We demonstrate that the specific part of the gradient for rare token embeddings is the key cause of the degeneration problem for all tokens during training stage.  בהתבסס על הניתוח, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה שנקראת, גיטינג gradient מתאים (AGG). AGG מתמודד עם בעיית השמירה על ידי גייטור החלק המיוחד של הקרידיינט עבור סימנים נדירים. תוצאות ניסיוניות מדוגל שפה, דומות מילים, ומשימות התרגום מכונות באופן כמוני ואיכותי לאמת את היעילות של AGG.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་གསོག་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ནི་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་རིགས་དཔེ་གཞིའི་ནང་གི་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ནི་ཉེ་གནས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ བྱུང་སྣང་འདིས་ཕལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། གནས་ཡུལ In this study, we analyze the training dynamics of the token embeddings focusing on rare token embedding. ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་མཐོ་རིམ་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་ནི་མཐོ་ཁག་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཡིན། Based on the analysis, we propose a novel method called, adaptive gradient gating(AGG). AGG addresses the degeneration problem by gating the specific part of the gradient for rare token embeddings. སྐད'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'AlephBERT: تدريب ما قبل نموذج اللغة والتقييم من Sub-Word إلى مستوى الجملة', 'pt': 'AlephBERT: Pré-treinamento e avaliação do modelo de linguagem da subpalavra ao nível da sentença', 'es': 'AlephBert: Preentrenamiento y evaluación del modelo de lenguaje desde el nivel de subpalabra hasta el nivel de oración', 'fr': 'AlePhbert\xa0: Pré-formation et évaluation du modèle linguistique du sous-mot au niveau de la phrase', 'ja': 'AlephBERT ：サブワードから文章レベルまでの言語モデルの事前トレーニングと評価', 'zh': 'AlephBERT:从子词到言,利有质', 'ru': 'AlephBERT: Предварительное обучение и оценка языковой модели от подслова до уровня предложения', 'hi': 'AlephBERT: भाषा मॉडल पूर्व प्रशिक्षण और उप-शब्द से वाक्य स्तर तक मूल्यांकन', 'ga': 'AlephBERT: Réamhoiliúint agus Meastóireacht ar Mhúnla Teanga ón bhFocal go Leibhéal na Pianbhreithe', 'ka': 'AlephBERT: ენის მოდელის წინ განათლება და განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'AlephBERT: A nyelvi modell előképzése és értékelése az alszótól a mondatszintig', 'el': 'Προεκπαίδευση και αξιολόγηση γλωσσικών μοντέλων από το επίπεδο υπολέξεων έως τις προτάσεις', 'it': 'AlephBERT: Pre-formazione e valutazione del modello linguistico dal livello di sottoparola al livello di frase', 'mk': 'AlephBERT: Преобука и евалуација на јазичкиот модел од подзбор до ниво на реченица', 'kk': 'AlephBERT: Тіл үлгісі алдындағы оқыту мен оқыту үлгісі', 'lt': 'AlephBERT: kalbos modelio parengiamasis mokymas ir vertinimas nuo žodžio papunkčio iki bausmės lygio', 'ms': 'AlephBERT: Pra-latihan Model Bahasa dan Evaluasi dari Sub-Word ke Aras Hukuman', 'ml': 'അലെഫ്ബെര്\u200dട്ട്: ഭാഷ മോഡില്\u200d നിന്നും സബ്വോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d നിന്നും ശിക്ഷയുടെ നിലം', 'mt': 'AlephBERT: Il-mudell lingwistiku ta’ taħriġ minn qabel u Evalwazzjoni minn Livell ta’ Subkliem sa Sentenza', 'mn': 'Алефберт: Холбоо загварын урд сургалт болон үнэлгээ', 'no': 'AlephBERT: Språk- modell føreøving og evaluering frå underordet til setningsnivå', 'pl': 'AlephBERT: Przedszkolenie i ocena modelu językowego od podsłowa do poziomu zdań', 'ro': 'AlephBERT: Pregătirea și evaluarea modelului lingvistic de la subcuvânt la nivelul propoziției', 'sr': 'AlephBERT: Model jezika pre obuke i procjene od podreči na nivo kazne', 'si': 'AlephBERT: භාෂා මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරධානය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය සබ- වචන ස්ථානයෙන් වාර්තාව', 'sv': 'AlephBERT: Språkmodell Pre-utbildning och utvärdering från underord till meningsnivå', 'so': 'AlephBERT: Tusaale-tababar-horaadka iyo qiimeynta luqada', 'ta': 'AlephBERT: மொழி மாதிரி பயிற்சி முன்னால் மற்றும் உப- வார்த்திலிருந்து வாக்கியம் மட்டத்திற்கு மதிப்பு', 'ur': 'AlephBERT: Language Model Pre- training and Evaluation from Sub- Word to Sentence Level', 'uz': 'AlephBERT: Tilning taʼminlovchi oldin va tasdiqlash', 'vi': 'AlephBERT: Báo cáo ngôn ngữ mặc định huấn luyện và đánh giá từ giai đoạn con đến giai điệu.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучение и оценка на езиковия модел от поддума до ниво на изречение', 'hr': 'AlephBERT: Preobuka i procjena jezičkog modela od podriječi na razinu kazne', 'da': 'AlephBERT: Sprogmodel Foruddannelse og evaluering fra underord til sætningsniveau', 'nl': 'AlephBERT: Voortraining en evaluatie van het taalmodel van sub-woord tot zinsniveau', 'de': 'AlephBERT: Sprachmodellvorbereitung und Evaluation von Sub-Word- bis Satzebene', 'id': 'AlephBERT: Pra-pelatihan Model Bahasa dan Evaluasi dari Sub-Word ke Level Sentence', 'ko': 'AlephBERT: 자어에서 문장까지의 언어 모델 사전 훈련 및 평가', 'fa': 'AlephBERT: مدل پیش آموزش و ارزیابی زبان از زیر کلمه به سطح فیلم', 'sw': 'AlephBERT: Model of Preliminary Lugha and Evaluation from Subword to Sentence', 'tr': 'AlefBERT: Dil Modeli Öň bellenen we Taýýarlama', 'sq': 'AlephBERT: Parastërvitja dhe vlerësimi i modelit të gjuhës nga niveli i nënfjalës në nivelin e dënimit', 'am': 'Language Model Pre-training and Evaluation from Sub-Word to Sentence Level', 'az': 'AlephBERT: Dil Modeli 칐n-t톛hsil v톛 칐n-S칬z칲nd톛n S칬zl칲k Seviye', 'bn': 'AlephBERT: সাবওয়ার্ড থেকে শাস্তি পর্যন্ত ভাষার প্রশিক্ষণ ও মূল্যায়ন', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'ԱլեֆԲերթ. լեզվի մոդելի նախավարժման և գնահատման մակարդակից մինչև նախաբառ մակարդակը', 'bs': 'AlephBERT: Preobuka i procjena jezičkog modela od podriječi na nivo kazne', 'cs': 'AlephBERT: Jazykový model předškolení a hodnocení z podslovní úrovně až po věty', 'ca': 'AlephBERT: Pre-entrenament i evaluació del model de llenguatge des de subparaula al nivell de frases', 'et': 'AlephBERT: Keelemudeli eelkoolitus ja hindamine alasõnast lausetasemeni', 'fi': 'AlephBERT: Kielimallin esikoulutus ja arviointi alasanasta lausetasolle', 'jv': 'alefBERT: Language model', 'he': 'AlephBERT: מודל שפה התאמנה קדימה והערכה מ Sub-Word לשלב גזרה', 'sk': 'AlephBERT: Predusposabljanje jezikovnega modela in ocenjevanje od podbesed do stopnje stavka', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'AlephBERT: Language Model Pre-training and Evaluation from Sub-Word to Sentence Level'}
{'en': 'Applying existing methods to emotional support conversation—which provides valuable assistance to people who are in need—has two major limitations: (a) they generally employ a conversation-level emotion label, which is too coarse-grained to capture user’s instant mental state; (b) most of them focus on expressing empathy in the response(s) rather than gradually reducing user’s distress. To address the problems, we propose a novel model \\textbf{MISC}, which firstly infers the user’s fine-grained emotional status, and then responds skillfully using a mixture of strategy. Experimental results on the benchmark dataset demonstrate the effectiveness of our method and reveal the benefits of fine-grained emotion understanding as well as mixed-up strategy modeling.', 'ar': 'أصبحت النماذج اللغوية الكبيرة المدربة مسبقًا (PLM) موجودة في كل مكان في تطوير تقنية فهم اللغة وتقع في صميم العديد من تطورات الذكاء الاصطناعي. في حين أن التطورات التي تم الإبلاغ عنها للغة الإنجليزية باستخدام PLMs غير مسبوقة ، فإن التطورات المبلغ عنها باستخدام PLMs للعبرية قليلة ومتباعدة. المشكلة ذات شقين. أولاً ، حتى الآن ، الموارد العبرية لتدريب نماذج اللغة الكبيرة ليست بنفس الحجم مثل نظرائهم الإنجليز. ثانيًا ، تتطلب معظم المعايير المتاحة لتقييم التقدم في المعالجة اللغوية العصبية العبرية حدودًا مورفولوجية غير متوفرة في مخرجات PLMs القياسية. في هذا العمل نعالج كلا الجانبين. نقدم AlephBERT ، PLM كبير للعبرية الحديثة ، تم تدريبه على مفردات أكبر ومجموعة بيانات أكبر من أي PLM عبري من قبل. علاوة على ذلك ، نقدم بنية عصبية جديدة تستعيد المقاطع المورفولوجية المشفرة في نواقل التضمين السياقية. بناءً على هذا المكون الصرفي الجديد ، نقدم مجموعة تقييم تتكون من مهام ومعايير متعددة تغطي تحليلات مستوى الجملة ومستوى الكلمة والكلمة الفرعية. في جميع المهام ، حصلت ألفبرت على نتائج متطورة تتجاوز خطوط الأساس العبرية المعاصرة. نجعل نموذج AlephBERT الخاص بنا ونموذج الاستخراج الصرفي ومجموعة التقييم العبرية متاحة للجمهور لتقييم PLM العبرية المستقبلية.', 'es': 'Los grandes modelos lingüísticos preentrenados (PLM) se han vuelto omnipresentes en el desarrollo de la tecnología de comprensión del lenguaje y se encuentran en el centro de muchos avances de la inteligencia artificial. Si bien los avances informados para el inglés que usa PLM no tienen precedentes, los avances informados en el uso de PLM para hebreo son pocos y distantes El problema es doble. En primer lugar, hasta ahora, los recursos hebreos para la formación de grandes modelos lingüísticos no son de la misma magnitud que sus homólogos ingleses. En segundo lugar, la mayoría de los puntos de referencia disponibles para evaluar el progreso en la PNL hebrea requieren límites morfológicos que no están disponibles en la salida de los PLM estándar. En este trabajo remediamos ambos aspectos. Presentamos Alephbert, un gran PLM para hebreo moderno, entrenado en un vocabulario más amplio y un conjunto de datos más grande que cualquier otro PLM hebreo anterior. Además, presentamos una arquitectura neuronal novedosa que recupera los segmentos morfológicos codificados en vectores de incrustación contextualizados. Basado en este nuevo componente morfológico, ofrecemos una suite de evaluación que consta de múltiples tareas y puntos de referencia que cubren análisis a nivel de oración, nivel de palabra y subpalabra. En todas las tareas, Alephbert obtiene resultados de vanguardia más allá de las líneas de base del hebreo contemporáneo. Ponemos a disposición del público nuestro modelo Alephbert, el modelo de extracción morfológica y la suite de evaluación hebrea para evaluar futuros PLM hebreos.', 'pt': 'Grandes Modelos de Linguagem Pré-treinados (PLMs) tornaram-se onipresentes no desenvolvimento da tecnologia de compreensão de linguagem e estão no centro de muitos avanços em inteligência artificial. Embora os avanços relatados para o inglês usando PLMs sejam sem precedentes, os avanços relatados usando PLMs para hebraico são poucos e distantes entre si. O problema é duplo. Primeiro, até agora, os recursos hebraicos para o treinamento de grandes modelos de linguagem não são da mesma magnitude que seus equivalentes em inglês. Em segundo lugar, a maioria dos benchmarks disponíveis para avaliar o progresso na PNL hebraica requer limites morfológicos que não estão disponíveis na saída de PLMs padrão. Neste trabalho remediamos ambos os aspectos. Apresentamos AlephBERT, um grande PLM para hebraico moderno, treinado em vocabulário maior e um conjunto de dados maior do que qualquer PLM hebraico anterior. Além disso, apresentamos uma nova arquitetura neural que recupera os segmentos morfológicos codificados em vetores de incorporação contextualizados. Com base neste novo componente morfológico, oferecemos um conjunto de avaliação composto por várias tarefas e benchmarks que abrangem análises em nível de sentença, nível de palavra e nível de subpalavra. Em todas as tarefas, AlephBERT obtém resultados de última geração além das linhas de base hebraicas contemporâneas. Disponibilizamos publicamente nosso modelo AlephBERT, o modelo de extração morfológica e o conjunto de avaliação hebraico, para avaliar futuros PLMs hebraicos.', 'fr': "Les grands modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés (PLM) sont devenus omniprésents dans le développement des technologies de compréhension des langues et sont au cœur de nombreuses avancées de l'intelligence artificielle. Alors que les avancées signalées pour l'anglais utilisant des PLM sont sans précédent, les avancées signalées dans l'utilisation de PLM pour l'hébreu sont rares. Le problème est double. Tout d'abord, jusqu'à présent, les ressources hébraïques pour la formation de grands modèles linguistiques ne sont pas de la même ampleur que leurs homologues anglais. Deuxièmement, la plupart des repères disponibles pour évaluer les progrès de la PNL hébraïque nécessitent des limites morphologiques qui ne sont pas disponibles dans la sortie des PLM standard. Dans ce travail, nous remédions à ces deux aspects. Nous présentons Alephbert, un grand PLM pour l'hébreu moderne, formé sur un vocabulaire plus large et un ensemble de données plus vaste que n'importe quel PLM hébreu auparavant. De plus, nous introduisons une nouvelle architecture neuronale qui récupère les segments morphologiques codés dans des vecteurs d'inclusion contextualisés. Sur la base de ce nouveau composant morphologique, nous proposons une suite d'évaluation composée de plusieurs tâches et points de référence qui couvrent les analyses au niveau de la phrase, au niveau des mots et des sous-mots. Pour toutes les tâches, Alephbert obtient des résultats de pointe au-delà des bases hébraïques contemporaines. Nous rendons notre modèle Alephbert, le modèle d'extraction morphologique et la suite d'évaluation hébraïque accessibles au public, pour évaluer les futurs PLM hébreux.", 'ja': '大規模な事前訓練された言語モデル（ PLM ）は、言語理解技術の発展において普遍的に使用されるようになり、多くの人工知能の進歩の中心に位置しています。 PLMを使用した英語の進歩は前例がないと報告されているが、ヘブライ語のPLMを使用した進歩はほとんど報告されておらず、間にはほとんどない。 問題は2つあります。第一に、大規模な言語モデルを訓練するためのヘブライ語のリソースは、今のところ英語のリソースと同等の大きさではありません。 第二に、ヘブライ語NLPの進捗状況を評価するために利用可能なほとんどのベンチマークは、標準的なPLMの出力では利用できない形態学的境界を必要とする。 この作業では、両方の側面を修復します。 現代ヘブライ語のための大規模なPLMであるAlephBERTを発表し、これまでのどのヘブライ語PLMよりも大きな語彙と大きなデータセットについて訓練を受けています。 さらに、文脈化された埋め込みベクトルに符号化された形態学的セグメントを回復する新規のニューラルアーキテクチャを紹介する。 この新しい形態学的コンポーネントに基づいて、文レベル、単語レベル、サブワードレベルの分析をカバーする複数のタスクとベンチマークからなる評価スイートを提供します。 すべてのタスクで、AlephBERTは現代のヘブライ語のベースラインを超えた最先端の結果を得ます。 私たちは、将来のヘブライ語PLMを評価するために、AlephBERTモデル、形態抽出モデル、およびヘブライ語評価スイートを公開しています。', 'zh': '大预训语(PLM)无不在言,多人工智能进步之心。 虽用PLM者英语告进前所未有,而用希伯来语PLM报者少。 重也。 先是,至目前为止,习大言希伯来语资源与英语对应物数不同。 其次,大抵可于评估希伯来语NLP进展之基准皆须形界,而此界PLM输中不可用。 于此二者,吾正此二者。 吾言AlephBERT者,今之希伯来语大PLM也,大于前希伯来语PLM之大词汇量,大数集也。 引入一新神经架构,可复向量中编码形片段。 凡此新形态学组件,共一评估套件,数务基准,涵盖句级,单词级与子单词等。 凡诸职事,AlephBERT皆超越当世希伯来语基线最先进。 吾将AlephBERT之,形态学取模与希伯来语估套件明,以质来者希伯来语PLM。', 'hi': 'बड़े पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल (पीएलएम) भाषा समझने वाली प्रौद्योगिकी के विकास में सर्वव्यापी हो गए हैं और कई कृत्रिम बुद्धिमत्ता अग्रिमों के दिल में झूठ बोलते हैं। जबकि पीएलएम का उपयोग करके अंग्रेजी के लिए रिपोर्ट की गई प्रगति अभूतपूर्व है, हिब्रू के लिए पीएलएम का उपयोग करके रिपोर्ट की गई प्रगति कुछ और बहुत दूर है। समस्या दोहरी है। सबसे पहले, अब तक, बड़ी भाषा मॉडल के प्रशिक्षण के लिए हिब्रू संसाधन उनके अंग्रेजी समकक्षों के समान परिमाण के नहीं हैं। दूसरा, हिब्रू एनएलपी में प्रगति का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए उपलब्ध अधिकांश बेंचमार्क को रूपात्मक सीमाओं की आवश्यकता होती है जो मानक पीएलएम के आउटपुट में उपलब्ध नहीं हैं। इस काम में हम दोनों पहलुओं को हल करते हैं। हम AlephBERT, आधुनिक हिब्रू के लिए एक बड़ा पीएलएम, बड़ी शब्दावली और किसी भी हिब्रू पीएलएम से पहले एक बड़ा डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका वास्तुकला का परिचय देते हैं जो संदर्भित एम्बेडिंग वैक्टर में एन्कोडेड रूपात्मक खंडों को पुनर्प्राप्त करता है। इस नए रूपात्मक घटक के आधार पर हम एक मूल्यांकन सूट प्रदान करते हैं जिसमें कई कार्य और बेंचमार्क शामिल होते हैं जो वाक्य-स्तर, शब्द-स्तर और उप-शब्द स्तर के विश्लेषण को कवर करते हैं। सभी कार्यों पर, AlephBERT समकालीन हिब्रू बेसलाइन से परे अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है। हम अपने AlephBERT मॉडल, रूपात्मक निष्कर्षण मॉडल, और हिब्रू मूल्यांकन सूट सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध बनाने के लिए, भविष्य के हिब्रू PLMs का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए.', 'ru': 'Крупные предварительно обученные языковые модели (PLM) стали повсеместным явлением в развитии технологии понимания языка и лежат в основе многих достижений искусственного интеллекта. Несмотря на то, что прогресс в использовании PLMS на английском языке является беспрецедентным, прогресс в использовании PLMS на иврите весьма незначителен. Проблема двояка. Во-первых, до сих пор ивритские ресурсы для обучения крупным языковым моделям не были такими же масштабными, как их английские коллеги. Во-вторых, большинство критериев, доступных для оценки прогресса в иврите NLP, требуют морфологических границ, которые не доступны в выходе стандартных PLM. В этой работе мы исправляем оба аспекта. Мы представляем AlephBERT, большую PLM для современного иврита, обученную на более крупном словарном запасе и большем наборе данных, чем любой иврит PLM раньше. Кроме того, мы вводим новую нейронную архитектуру, которая восстанавливает морфологические сегменты, закодированные в контекстуализированных векторах вложений. Основываясь на этом новом морфологическом компоненте, мы предлагаем набор оценок, состоящий из нескольких задач и критериев, которые охватывают анализ на уровне предложения, на уровне слова и на уровне подслова. По всем задачам AlephBERT получает самые современные результаты, выходящие за рамки современного еврейского языка. Мы делаем нашу модель AlephBERT, морфологическую модель извлечения и набор для оценки на иврите общедоступными для оценки будущих PLM на иврите.', 'ga': 'Tá Múnlaí Teanga Móra Réamhoilte (PLM) tar éis éirí uileláithreach i bhforbairt na teicneolaíochta tuisceana teanga agus tá siad ag croílár go leor dul chun cinn intleachta saorga. Cé nach bhfacthas dul chun cinn a thuairiscítear don Bhéarla ag baint úsáide as PLManna, is beag dul chun cinn a tuairiscíodh maidir le húsáid PLM don Eabhrais. Tá dhá fhadhb ag baint leis. Ar an gcéad dul síos, go dtí seo, níl na hacmhainní Eabhrais chun samhlacha móra teanga a oiliúint ar an méid céanna lena gcomhghleacaithe Béarla. Ar an dara dul síos, tá teorainneacha moirfeolaíocha de dhíth ar fhormhór na dtagarmharcanna atá ar fáil chun dul chun cinn a mheas sa NLP Eabhrais nach bhfuil ar fáil in aschur PLM caighdeánach. San obair seo leigheasaimid an dá ghné. Cuirimid i láthair AlephBERT, PLM mór don Nua-Eabhrais, oilte ar stór focal níos mó agus ar thacar sonraí níos mó ná aon PLM Eabhrais roimhe seo. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid isteach ailtireacht néarúil nua a aisghabhann na míreanna moirfeolaíocha atá ionchódaithe i veicteoirí leabaithe comhthéacsúla. Bunaithe ar an gcomhpháirt mhoirfeolaíoch nua seo cuirimid sraith mheastóireachta ar fáil a chuimsíonn tascanna iolracha agus tagarmharcanna a chlúdaíonn anailísí ar leibhéal na habairte, ar leibhéal na bhfocal agus ar na fofhocail. Maidir le gach tasc, faigheann AlephBERT torthaí úrscothacha thar na bunlínte Eabhraise comhaimseartha. Cuirimid ár samhail AlephBERT, an tsamhail eastósctha moirfeolaíoch, agus an tsraith mheastóireachta Eabhraise ar fáil go poiblí, chun measúnú a dhéanamh ar PLManna Eabhraise sa todhchaí.', 'el': 'Τα μεγάλα προσχεδιασμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα έχουν γίνει πανταχού παρόντα στην ανάπτυξη της τεχνολογίας κατανόησης γλωσσών και βρίσκονται στην καρδιά πολλών προόδων τεχνητής νοημοσύνης. Ενώ οι πρόοδοι που αναφέρθηκαν για τα αγγλικά χρησιμοποιώντας PLMs είναι πρωτοφανείς, οι αναφερθείσες πρόοδοι που χρησιμοποιούν PLMs για τα εβραϊκά είναι λίγες και μακρινές. Το πρόβλημα είναι διττό. Πρώτον, μέχρι στιγμής, οι εβραϊκοί πόροι για την εκπαίδευση μεγάλων γλωσσικών μοντέλων δεν είναι του ίδιου μεγέθους με τους αγγλικούς ομολόγους τους. Δεύτερον, τα περισσότερα διαθέσιμα σημεία αναφοράς για την αξιολόγηση της προόδου στην εβραϊκή ΝΛΠ απαιτούν μορφολογικά όρια τα οποία δεν είναι διαθέσιμα στην παραγωγή των τυποποιημένων PLMs. Σε αυτό το έργο διορθώνουμε και τις δύο πτυχές. Σας παρουσιάζουμε ένα μεγάλο για τα σύγχρονα εβραϊκά, εκπαιδευμένο σε μεγαλύτερο λεξιλόγιο και ένα μεγαλύτερο σύνολο δεδομένων από οποιοδήποτε εβραϊκό πριν. Επιπλέον, εισάγουμε μια νέα νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική που ανακτά τα μορφολογικά τμήματα που κωδικοποιούνται σε συνδεόμενα μέσα ενσωμάτωσης. Με βάση αυτό το νέο μορφολογικό συστατικό προσφέρουμε μια σουίτα αξιολόγησης που αποτελείται από πολλαπλές εργασίες και δείκτες αναφοράς που καλύπτουν αναλύσεις σε επίπεδο πρότασης, επιπέδου λέξεων και υπολέξεων. Σε όλα τα καθήκοντα, ο Αλεξμπερτ επιτυγχάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας πέρα από τις σύγχρονες εβραϊκές βάσεις. Κάνουμε το μοντέλο μας, το μορφολογικό μοντέλο εξαγωγής και την εβραϊκή σουίτα αξιολόγησης δημόσια διαθέσιμα, για την αξιολόγηση μελλοντικών εβραϊκών PLMs.', 'hu': 'A nagy előképzett nyelvi modellek (PLM) mindenütt jelen vannak a nyelvértési technológia fejlesztésében, és számos mesterséges intelligencia fejlődésének középpontjában állnak. Míg az angol nyelven jelentett előrelépések példátlanok, a héber nyelven jelentett előrelépések azonban kevések és messze vannak a közöttük. A probléma kettős. Először is, eddig a nagy nyelvi modellek képzésére szolgáló héber források nem azonos mértékűek, mint az angol társaik. Másodszor, a héber NLP előrehaladásának értékeléséhez rendelkezésre álló referenciaértékek többsége olyan morfológiai határokat igényel, amelyek nem állnak rendelkezésre a standard PLM kimenetében. Ebben a munkában mindkét aspektust orvosoljuk. Bemutatjuk az AlephBERT-et, egy nagy PLM modern héber nyelvre, amely nagyobb szókincsre és nagyobb adatkészletre képzett, mint bármely héber PLM korábban. Továbbá bemutatunk egy új neurális architektúrát, amely visszaállítja a kontextuális beágyazási vektorokba kódolt morfológiai szegmenseket. Ezen új morfológiai komponens alapján többféle feladatból és referenciaértékből álló értékelő csomagot kínálunk, amelyek magukban foglalják a mondatszint, a szó- és az alszint elemzéseket. Az AlephBERT minden feladatnál korszerű eredményeket ér el a kortárs héber alapokon túl. Az AlephBERT modellt, a morfológiai extrakciós modellt és a héber értékelő csomagot nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé tesszük a jövőbeli héber PLM-ek értékeléséhez.', 'ka': 'უფრო დიდი წინასწარმოადგენებული ენის მოდელები (PLMs) იყო ენის განვითარების ტექნოლოგიის განვითარებაში, და უფრო მეცნიერი ინტელექტიური ინტელექტიური პროგრესის შუალში. მაგრამ პროგრესის გამოყენებაში ინგლისური პროგრესისთვის გამოიყენებული პროგრესი არიან პროგრესიენტი, მაგრამ პროგრესისთვის გამოყენებული პროგრესისთვი პრობლემა ექნება. პირველი, ახლა, ჰებრიური რესურსი დიდი ენის მოდელეების განაკლებისთვის არიან იგივე მაგრამ, როგორც ისინი ანგლისური კონტაქტები. მეორე, უფრო მეტი ბენქმარიკი, რომელიც აქვს წარმოდგენისთვის ჰებერი NLP-ში პროგრესის განსაზღვრებისთვის მორჩენა მორფოლოგიური დრინეები, რომელიც არ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ორივე აპექტიკების განსხვავება. ჩვენ ალეფბერტის შესახებ, მოდინარე ჰებერიოს დიდი PLM, რომელიც უფრო დიდი სიტყვებულაზე და უფრო დიდი მონაცემების სექტი, ვიდრე ვიდრე იბერიო დამატებით, ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ნეიროლური აქტიქტურაცია, რომელიც მოპოროლოგიური ჟეგმენტებში კონტექსტუალურად ჩატვირთებულია. ამ ახალი მორპოლოგიური კომპონონენტის ბაზაზე ჩვენ მივიღეთ განსაზღვრების სუტი, რომელიც მრავალ დავალებებით და ბენქმარკების განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც საკუთარი სიტყვას, სი ყველა სამუშაოში, ალეფბერტი მიიღება სამუშაო ჰებური ბაზლინის გარეშე. ჩვენ ალეფბერტის მოდელი, მორპოლოგიური ექსტრექციის მოდელი, და ჰებერიური განსაზღვრების სახელსაწინო სახელსაწინო სახელსაწინო შესაძლებელია, მომავალე ჰებ', 'it': "I grandi modelli linguistici pre-addestrati (PLM) sono diventati onnipresenti nello sviluppo della tecnologia di comprensione del linguaggio e sono al centro di molti progressi dell'intelligenza artificiale. Mentre i progressi segnalati per l'inglese utilizzando PLM sono senza precedenti, i progressi segnalati utilizzando PLM per l'ebraico sono pochi e lontani. Il problema è duplice. In primo luogo, finora, le risorse ebraiche per la formazione di grandi modelli linguistici non sono della stessa grandezza delle loro controparti inglesi. In secondo luogo, la maggior parte dei benchmark disponibili per valutare i progressi nel PNL ebraico richiedono confini morfologici che non sono disponibili nell output dei PLM standard. In questo lavoro risolviamo entrambi gli aspetti. Vi presentiamo AlephBERT, un grande PLM per l'ebraico moderno, formato su un vocabolario più ampio e un set di dati più ampio di qualsiasi PLM ebraico prima. Inoltre, introduciamo una nuova architettura neurale che recupera i segmenti morfologici codificati in vettori di embedding contestualizzati. Sulla base di questa nuova componente morfologica offriamo una suite di valutazione composta da molteplici attività e benchmark che coprono analisi a livello di frase, livello di parola e livello di sub-parola. In tutti i compiti, AlephBERT ottiene risultati all'avanguardia oltre le linee di base ebraiche contemporanee. Rendiamo pubblicamente disponibili il nostro modello AlephBERT, il modello di estrazione morfologica e la suite di valutazione ebraica, per valutare i futuri PLM ebraici.", 'kk': 'Үлкен алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілері (PLMs) тілдерді түсіну технологиясын жасау үшін әрқашанда болып, көптеген көптеген жұмыс интеллекті бағдарламалардың ортасында жатыр. PLMs қолданып ағылшын тілінде жұмыс істеу туралы хабарлаған, жұмыс ілеспе PLMs қолданып тұрған жұмыс ілеспе жұмыс ілеспейді. Мәселе екі рет. Біріншіден, үлкен тіл үлгілерін оқыту үшін еврей ресурстары ағылшын тілдерінің көмегімен бірдей емес. Екіншіден, Иврит NLP бағдарламасын бағалау үшін қол жеткізетін бағдарламалардың көпшілігі стандартты PLMs шығысында жоқ морфологиялық шектері керек. Бұл жұмыс ішінде екі аспекті жақсартық. Біз AlephBERT-ті, Modern Hebrew PLM үлкен, үлкен сөздерді және алдыңғы Иврит PLM-ден үлкен деректер жинағын көрсетедік. Сонымен қатар, біз контекстуалды ендіру векторында кодталған морфологиялық сегменттерді қайтаруға болады. Бұл жаңа морфологиялық компонентіне негізделген бірнеше тапсырмалар мен кеңістіктерді, сөздер деңгейінде және ішкі сөздер деңгейінің анализациялауларының бірнеше тапсырмаларды жасайтын бағала Барлық тапсырмаларда AlephBERT қазіргі Иврит негізгі сызықтарының күйінің нәтижесін алды. Біз AlephBERT үлгісімізді, морфологиялық тарқату үлгісіміз, және Иврит оқу үлгісімізді көбірек қол жеткізеді. Болашақ Иврит PLMs дегенді оқу үшін.', 'lt': 'Dideli iš anksto parengti kalbos modeliai (PLM) tapo visur paplitę plėtojant kalbos supratimo technologijas ir yra daugelio dirbtinio žvalgybos pažangos pagrindas. Nors pažanga, apie kurią pranešta anglų kalbai naudojant PLM, yra precedento neturinti, pažanga, apie kurią pranešta, naudojant PLM hebrajų kalba, yra nedaug ir toli nuo. Problema dviguba. Pirma, iki šiol hebrajų ištekliai didelių kalbų modelių mokymui nėra tokie patys kaip jų anglų kolegos. Second, most benchmarks available to evaluate progress in Hebrew NLP require morphological boundaries which are not available in the output of standard PLMs.  Šiame darbe ištaisome abu aspektus. Mes pristatome AlephBERT, didelį PLM šiuolaikiniam hebrajui, apmokytą didesniu žodynu ir didesniu duomenų rinkiniu nei bet kuris anksčiau hebrajų PLM. Be to, įvedame naują neurologinę architektūrą, kuri atkuria morfologinius segmentus, koduotus kontekstiniuose įterpiamuosiuose vektoriuose. Remiantis šiuo nauju morfologiniu komponentu siūlome vertinimo rinkinį, sudarytą iš kelių užduočių ir lyginamųjų rodiklių, apimančių sakinių, žodžių ir žodžių lygio analizę. Per visas užduotis AlephBERT gauna pažangiausius rezultatus už šiuolaikinių hebrajų bazinių linijų ribų. Mes viešai paskelbiame savo AlephBERT model į, morfologinį ekstrahavimo modelį ir hebrajų vertinimo rinkinį būsimoms hebrajų PLM įvertinti.', 'mk': 'Големите предобучени јазички модели (ПЛМ) станаа насекаде во развојот на технологијата за разбирање на јазикот и се наоѓаат во срцето на многу вештачки интелигенциски напредоци. Иако напредокот објавен за англиски користејќи ПЛМ е непрецедент, објавените напредоци користејќи ПЛМ за еврејски се мали и далеку помеѓу нив. Проблемот е двојен. First, so far, Hebrew resources for training large language models are not of the same magnitude as their English counterparts.  Второ, повеќето стандардни значки достапни за проценка на напредокот во еврејскиот НЛП бараат морфолошки граници кои не се достапни во излезот на стандардните ПЛМ. Во оваа работа ги решаваме двата аспекти. Го претставуваме АлефБерт, голем ПЛМ за Модерниот Евреин, обучен на поголем речник и поголем податок од било кој Евреин ПЛМ претходно. Покрај тоа, воведуваме нова нервна архитектура која ги обновува морфолошките сегменти кодирани во контекстуални вградени вектори. На основа на овој нов морфолошки компонент ние нудиме аплет за проценка кој се состои од повеќе задачи и референтни значки кои покриваат анализи на ниво на реченици, ниво на зборови и ниво на подзборови. На сите задачи АлефБЕРТ добива најдобри резултати надвор од современите еврејски бази. We make our AlephBERT model, the morphological extraction model, and the Hebrew evaluation suite publicly available, for evaluating future Hebrew PLMs.', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d (പിഎല്\u200dഎസ്) ഭാഷ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ വിദ്യാഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dമ്മിക പിഎല്\u200dഎസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കുള്ള പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യപ്പെടുമ്പോള്\u200d ഹെബ്രൂട്ടിക്കുള്ള പ്രശ്നം രണ്ടിരട്ടിയാണ്. ആദ്യം, ഇതുവരെ ഹെബ്രൂട്ട് വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d, വലിയ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കൂട @ info ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളും ശുദ്ധീകരിക്കുന്നു. ആധുനിക ഹെബ്രെയിബ്രെറ്റിന് ഒരു വലിയ പിഎല്\u200dഎം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അലെഫ്ബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് എബ്രീബ് പിഎല്\u200dഎമിനെ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റോക്സ്റ്റ്യൂട്ടിങ് വെക്റ്ററില്\u200d എ Based on this new morphological component we offer an evaluation suite consisting of multiple tasks and benchmarks that cover sentence-level, word-level and sub-word level analyses.  എല്ലാ ജോലികളിലും, ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ഹീബ്രി ബേസ്ലൈനുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുന്\u200dപ് അലെഫ്ബെര്\u200dട്ട് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാര്\u200dട്ട് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ അലെഫ്ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ മോഡല്\u200d, മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d പുറത്തിറങ്ങുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d, ഹെബ്രൂബിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ സ്യൂട്ട് പ്രസ്ത', 'mt': 'Mudelli lingwistiċi kbar mħarrġa minn qabel (PLMs) saru kullimkien fl-iżvilupp tat-teknoloġija tal-fehim tal-lingwi u jinsabu fil-qalba ta’ ħafna avvanzi ta’ intelliġenza artifiċjali. Filwaqt li l-avvanzi rrappurtati għall-Ingliż bl-użu tal-PLMs mhumiex preċedenti, il-avvanzi rrappurtati bl-użu tal-PLMs għall-Ebrej huma ftit u ħafna bejn. Il-problema hija doppja. L-ewwel nett, s’issa, ir-riżorsi Hebrewi għat-taħriġ ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi kbar mhumiex tal-istess daqs tal-kontropartijiet Ingliżi tagħhom. Second, most benchmarks available to evaluate progress in Hebrew NLP require morphological boundaries which are not available in the output of standard PLMs.  F’dan ix-xogħol irrimedjaw iż-żewġ aspetti. Aħna nippreżentaw AlephBERT, PLM kbir għall-Ebrej Modern, imħarreġ fuq vokabulari akbar u sett ta’ dejta akbar minn kwalunkwe PLM Ebrej qabel. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nintroduċu arkitettura newrali ġdida li tirkupra s-segmenti morfoloġiċi kkodifikati f’vetturi inkorporati kuntestwalizzati. Based on this new morphological component we offer an evaluation suite consisting of multiple tasks and benchmarks that cover sentence-level, word-level and sub-word level analyses.  Fuq il-kompiti kollha, AlephBERT jikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati lil hinn mil-linji bażi tal-Ebrej kontemporanji. Aħna nagħmlu disponibbli pubblikament il-mudell AlephBERT tagħna, il-mudell ta’ estrazzjoni morfoloġika, u s-sett ta’ evalwazzjoni Ebreja, għall-evalwazzjoni tal-PLMs Ebreja futuri.', 'ms': 'Model Bahasa Terlatih Terbesar (PLMs) telah menjadi luas di mana-mana dalam pembangunan teknologi pemahaman bahasa dan terletak di tengah banyak kemajuan kecerdasan buatan. Sementara kemajuan yang dilaporkan untuk bahasa Inggeris menggunakan PLM tidak terdahulu, kemajuan yang dilaporkan menggunakan PLM untuk bahasa Hebrew adalah sedikit dan jauh antara. Masalahnya dua kali. Pertama, sejauh ini, sumber Ibrani untuk melatih model bahasa besar tidak sama besar dengan rakan-rakan Inggeris mereka. Kedua, kebanyakan tanda referensi yang tersedia untuk menilai kemajuan dalam NLP Hebrew memerlukan sempadan morfologi yang tidak tersedia dalam output PLMs piawai. Dalam kerja ini kita memperbaiki kedua-dua aspek. Kami memperkenalkan AlephBERT, PLM yang besar untuk Hebrew Modern, dilatih pada vocabulari yang lebih besar dan set data yang lebih besar daripada mana-mana PLM Hebrew sebelumnya. Selain itu, kami memperkenalkan arkitektur saraf baru yang mengembalikan segmen morfologi yang dikodifikasikan dalam vektor penyembedding kontekstualisasi. Berdasarkan komponen morfologik baru ini, kami menawarkan suite penilaian yang terdiri dari tugas berbilang dan tanda rujukan yang meliputi analisis aras kalimat, aras perkataan dan aras bawah perkataan. Dalam semua tugas, AlephBERT mendapatkan keputusan-state-of-the-art di luar garis dasar Hebrew kontempor. We make our AlephBERT model, the morphological extraction model, and the Hebrew evaluation suite publicly available, for evaluating future Hebrew PLMs.', 'no': 'Stor føretrained språk-modeller (PLMs) har blitt omvendt i utviklinga av språk-forstørringsverktøy og ligg i hjertet av mange kunstiske intelligentsforstørringar. Mens avanserte for engelsk bruk av PLMs er uventa, rapporterte avanserte ved bruk av PLMs for Hebrew er få og langt mellom. Problemet er to gamle. Først, så langt, hebreiske ressursar for å lære store språk-modeller er ikkje av same storleik som dei engelske counterpartane. Andre, dei fleste benchmarkane som er tilgjengelege for å evaluera framgang i hebresisk NLP krev morfologiske grenser som ikkje er tilgjengelege i utdata av standard PLMs. I dette arbeidet rettar vi begge aspektar. Vi presenterer AlephBERT, ein stor PLM for moderne Hebrew, trent på større ordliste og ein større dataset enn alle Hebrew PLM før. I tillegg introduserer vi ein novel neuralarkitektur som gjenoppretter morfologiske segmentane koda i kontekstualiserte innbyggingsvektorar. Basert på denne nye morfologiske komponenten tilbyr vi ein evalueringssuite som inneheld fleire oppgåver og benchmarker som dekkar setningsnivå, ordnivå og underordnivå. På alle oppgåver får AlephBERT status-of-the-art-resultat bort tidlegare hebresisk baseline. Vi gjer vårt AlephBERT-modell, morfologisk ekstraksjonsmodell, og den hebreiske evalueringssuiten tilgjengeleg for å evaluera framtidige hebreiske PLMs.', 'pl': 'Duże wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe (PLM) stały się wszechobecne w rozwoju technologii rozumienia języka i leżą u podstaw wielu postępów sztucznej inteligencji. Podczas gdy postępy zgłaszane w języku angielskim za pomocą PLM są bezprecedensowe, zgłoszone postępy w użyciu PLM dla hebrajskiego są niewielkie i dalekie między nimi. Problem jest dwojaki. Po pierwsze, jak dotąd zasoby hebrajskie do szkolenia dużych modeli językowych nie mają tej samej wielkości co ich angielskie odpowiedniki. Po drugie, większość punktów odniesienia dostępnych do oceny postępu w hebrajskim NLP wymaga granic morfologicznych, które nie są dostępne w wynikach standardowych PLM. W tej pracy naprawiamy oba aspekty. Przedstawiamy AlephBERT, duży PLM dla współczesnego hebrajskiego, przeszkolony na większym słownictwie i większym zbiorze danych niż jakikolwiek hebrajski PLM wcześniej. Ponadto wprowadzamy nową architekturę neuronową, która odzyskuje segmenty morfologiczne zakodowane w kontekstualizowanych wektorach osadzania. W oparciu o ten nowy składnik morfologiczny oferujemy zestaw oceny składający się z wielu zadań i wskaźników referencyjnych obejmujących analizy na poziomie zdań, słowa i podsłowa. Podczas wszystkich zadań AlephBERT uzyskuje najnowocześniejsze wyniki wykraczające poza współczesne podstawy hebrajskie. Udostępniamy nasz model AlephBERT, model ekstrakcji morfologicznej oraz zestaw ewaluacji hebrajskiej publicznie do oceny przyszłych hebrajskich PLM.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварууд (ПЛМ) хэл ойлголтын технологийг хөгжүүлж, уран бүтээлч ухааны хөгжлийн зүрх дээр байдаг. Гэхдээ англи хэлний ПЛМ-г ашиглах хөгжлийн хувьд хэзээ ч өмнө нь харагдахгүй байсан ч Хибра хэлний ПЛМ-г ашиглах хөгжлийн хувьд хэдэн, хоорондоо хол бай Энэ асуудал хоёр дахь. Эхлээд хэл загваруудыг суралцахын тулд ихэврийн боловсрол Англи хэл загваруудтай адилхан биш. Хоёрдугаар, ихэнх хэмжээсүүд Хэврийн НLP-ын хөгжлийг үнэлэх боломжгүй морфологик хязгаар шаардлагатай. Энэ ажлын тулд бид хоёр талаарх асуудлыг сайжруулдаг. Бид Орчин үеийн Хеврийн том ПЛМ AlephBERT-г илтгэдэг. Өмнө нь ихрийн ПЛМээс илүү том өгөгдлийн санг суралцаж байсан. Мөн бид мөн нөхцөл дүрслэгдсэн векторуудад шинэ морфологик загваруудыг сэргээх шинэ мэдрэлийн архитектурыг танилцуулдаг. Энэ шинэ морфологик компонент дээр бид хэдэн даалгавар, шалгалтын хэмжээг, үг хэмжээг, суб-үг хэмжээг шинжилдэг олон даалгавар болон багц багц байгуулагддаг шалгалтын загвар өгдөг Бүх ажил дээр Алефберт орчин үеийн Хибраи суурь шугам дээр улс төрийн үр дүнг авдаг. Бид AlephBERT загварыг, морфологик хадгалах загвар, Хеврийн оюутнуудыг олон нийтэд ашиглах боломжтой болгож ирээдүйн Хибра ПЛМ-г оюутнуудын тулд хийдэг.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite mari (PLM) au devenit omniprezente în dezvoltarea tehnologiei de înțelegere a limbilor și se află în centrul multor progrese ale inteligenței artificiale. În timp ce progresele raportate pentru limba engleză folosind PLM sunt fără precedent, progresele raportate folosind PLM pentru ebraică sunt puține și departe între ele. Problema este dublă. În primul rând, până în prezent, resursele ebraice pentru formarea modelelor lingvistice mari nu sunt de aceeași amploare ca omologii lor în limba engleză. În al doilea rând, majoritatea criteriilor de referință disponibile pentru evaluarea progresului în PNL ebraic necesită limite morfologice care nu sunt disponibile în obținerea PLM standard. În această lucrare remediem ambele aspecte. Vă prezentăm AlephBERT, un PLM mare pentru ebraică modernă, instruit pe vocabular mai mare și un set de date mai mare decât orice PLM ebraic înainte. Mai mult decât atât, introducem o arhitectură neurală nouă care recuperează segmentele morfologice codificate în vectori de încorporare contextualizați. Pe baza acestei noi componente morfologice oferim o suită de evaluare compusă din mai multe sarcini și criterii de referință care acoperă analize la nivel de frază, nivel de cuvânt și nivel de subcuvânt. Pe toate sarcinile, AlephBERT obține rezultate de ultimă generație dincolo de liniile de bază ebraice contemporane. Facem public modelul nostru AlephBERT, modelul de extracție morfologică și suita de evaluare ebraică pentru evaluarea viitoarelor PLM ebraice.', 'sr': 'Veliki predobučeni jezički modeli (PLMs) postali su svuda u razvoju tehnologije razumevanja jezika i ležali u srcu mnogih umetničkih napredova inteligencije. Iako su napredovi prijavljeni za engleski korištenje PLMs neprecedentni, prijavljeni napredak korištenja PLMs za hebrejski su malo i daleko između njih. Problem je dva puta. Prvo, do sada, hebrejske resurse za obuku velikih jezičkih modela nisu isto veličine kao i njihovi engleski kolege. Drugo, većina kriterija dostupnih za procjenu napreda na hebrejskom NLP zahteva morfološke granice koje nisu dostupne u izlazu standardnih PLMs-a. U ovom poslu srediæemo oba aspekta. Predstavljamo AlephBERT, veliku PLM za moderni hebrejski, obučenu na većem rečniku i većem setu podataka od bilo kojeg hebrejskog PLM ranije. Osim toga, predstavljamo novu neuralnu arhitekturu koja oporavlja morfološke segmente kodirane u kontekstualiziranim ugrađenim vektorima. Na osnovu ovog novog morfološkog komponenta nudimo apartman za procjenu koji se sastoji od višestrukih zadataka i kriterija koji pokrivaju analizu nivoa rečenica, nivoa reči i nivoa podrečenja. Na svim zadacima, AlephBERT dobija rezultate umetnosti izvan trenutnih hebrejskih osnovnih linija. Napravimo naš AlephBERT model, morfološki model ekstrakcije, i hebrejski apartman za procjenu budućih hebrejskih PLMs.', 'si': 'ලොකු ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් (PlMs) භාෂා තාක්ෂණාව තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් විශාලනය කරලා තියෙන්න ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලට ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරධානයක් නැති වෙලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, හිබ්\u200dරීස් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක්. මුලින්, දැනටමත් හිබ්\u200dරු උපකරණය ලොකු භාෂා මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නෙවෙයි එයාලගේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සම්පූ දෙවෙනියි, බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් හිබ්\u200dරු NLP වල ප්\u200dරධානය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න හැකි විශ මේ වැඩේ අපි දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්නවා. අපි AlephBERT වෙනුවෙන්, අධ්\u200dයාන්\u200dය හිබ්\u200dරු වෙනුවෙන් ලොකු ප්\u200dලෑම් එකක්, ලොකු ශබ්ද භාෂාවක් සහ හිබ්\u200dරු ප්\u200dලෑම් වල තවත්, අපි නියම නිර්මාණ වෙක්ටර් වල සංකේතනයක් පුළුවන් කරනවා. මේ අළුත් මෝර්ෆෝලෝගික් අංකයක් අධිරූපයෙන් අපි විශ්ලේෂණ සූට් එකක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වාක්ය සහ බෙන්ච්මාර් සියළු වැඩේ ඇලෙෆ්බෙර්ට් ස්ථානය-of-the-art ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති අපි අපේ AlephBERT මොඩල්, මොර්ෆෝලෝගික් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව, හිබ්\u200dරු විශ්ලේෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප', 'so': 'Modelooyinka afka hore ee hore lagu tababaray (PLMs) waxay ku noqdeen kuwa aan daacad ahayn horumarinta teknolojiyada waxgarashada luuqada iyo beenta qalabka horumarinta waxgarashada farsamada badan. Inta lagu soo qoray horumarinta afka Ingiriiska ee isticmaalka PLMs, waxaa loo soo sheegay horumarinta isticmaalka PLMs ee Cibraaniyadu ay yaryihiin ilaa ka fog yihiin. Dhibaatadu waa laba jibbaar. Marka ugu horeysa, ilaa waqtigaas rasmiga afka Cibraaniyadu ma ahan mid lamid ah kuwa isbedelka ingiriisiga ah. Second, most benchmarks available in lagu qiimeeyo horumarinta Cibraaniyada NLP waxay u baahan yihiin xuduud morphological ah oo aan laga helin soo baxa standard PLMs. Shaqadan ayaan labada dhinac ka bogsanaynaa. Waxaynu soo jeednaa AlephBERT, PLM oo weyn oo afka Cibraaniga Modern ah, oo lagu tababariyey hadalka ka weyn iyo macluumaadka ka weyn ee ka horeysa PLM Cibraaniyada. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa dhismo neuro ah oo soo celinaya qeybaha morphologiga ah oo ku qoran wadooyin ay ku qoran yihiin waddooyinka ku socota. Based on this new morphological component we offer an evaluation suite consisting of multiple tasks and benchmarks that cover sentence-level, word-level and sub-word level analyses.  Shaqooyinka oo dhan AlephBERT wuxuu heli karaa fasaxa qoraalka farshaxanka ah oo ka dheer qorshaha afka Cibraaniga. Tusaale ahaan AlephBERT, Tusaale ka soo saarista morphologiga, iyo habka qiimeynta afka Cibraaniyadu wuxuu si bayaan ah u heli karaa, si aan qiimeynayno Ms.', 'sv': 'Stora Pre-Training Language Models (PLM) har blivit allestädes närvarande i utvecklingen av språkförståelse teknik och ligger i hjärtat av många artificiell intelligens framsteg. Medan framsteg som rapporterats för engelska med hjälp av PLM är oöverträffade, rapporterade framsteg med PLM för hebreiska är få och långt emellan. Problemet är dubbelt. För det första, hittills, hebreiska resurser för utbildning av stora språkmodeller är inte av samma storlek som deras engelska motsvarigheter. För det andra kräver de flesta referensvärden som finns tillgängliga för att utvärdera framsteg i hebreiska NLP morfologiska gränser som inte finns tillgängliga i output av standard PLM. I detta arbete åtgärdar vi båda aspekterna. Vi presenterar AlephBERT, en stor PLM för modern hebreiska, utbildad på större ordförråd och en större datamängd än någon hebreisk PLM tidigare. Dessutom introducerar vi en ny neural arkitektur som återställer de morfologiska segmenten kodade i kontextualiserade inbäddningsvektorer. Utifrån denna nya morfologiska komponent erbjuder vi en utvärderingssvit bestående av flera uppgifter och benchmarks som täcker meningsnivåanalyser, ordnivå och underordsnivåanalyser. På alla uppgifter får AlephBERT toppmoderna resultat utöver samtida hebreiska baslinjer. Vi gör vår AlephBERT-modell, den morfologiska extraktionsmodellen och den hebreiska utvärderingsviten offentligt tillgängliga för utvärdering av framtida hebreiska PLM.', 'ta': 'Large Pre-trained Language Models (PLMs) have become ubiquitous in the development of language understanding technology and lie at the heart of many artificial intelligence advances.  PLMs பயன்படுத்தி ஆங்கிலத்திற்கான முன்னேற்றங்கள் அறிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பிரச்சினை இரு மடங்காக உள்ளது. முதலில், இப்பொழுது பெரிய மொழி மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்யும் ஹீப்ரி மூலங்கள் அவர்களுடைய ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு எதிர் Second, most benchmarks available to evaluate progress in Hebrew NLP requires morphological border which is not available in the standard PLMs. வெளியீட்டில் இல்லை. இந்த வேலையில் நாம் இரு பகுதிகளையும் சரிபார்க்கிறோம். நாங்கள் அலெப்பெர்ட், ஒரு பெரிய பிஎல்எம் காண்பிக்கிறோம், முன்னர் பாதுகாப்பு ஹீப்பிரிக்கு, பெரிய சொல்வளத்தில் பயிற்சி செ மேலும், நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய புதிய உருவாக்கியத்தை அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது முன்னிருப்பு நிறுவப்படுத்தப்பட்ட நெறிகளில் குறியீட இந்த புதிய ஆராய்ந்த பொருளை அடிப்படையில் நாம் பல பணிகள் மற்றும் பொருள்களில் ஒரு மதிப்புரையை வழங்குகிறோம். வாக்கு- மட்டத்தை மற்றும் உச்சொ அனைத்து பணிகளிலும், தற்போதைய ஹீப்பி அடிக்கோடு நாங்கள் எங்கள் அலெப்பெர்ட் மாதிரியை உருவாக்குகிறோம், மாதிரி பிரிவுப்பு மாதிரி, மற்றும் ஹீப்ரி மதிப்பிடும் தொகுதி பொதுவாக க', 'ur': 'بڑے پیش آموزش کی زبان مدلز (PLMs) زبان سمجھنے کی تکنولوژی کی تغییر کی تغییر کی تغییر کی توسعہ میں ہر جگہ گئے ہیں اور بہت سی مصنوعی سمجھنے کی پیشرفت کے دل میں ہیں. اگرچہ انگلیسی کے لئے پیشرفت گزارے گئے PLMs کے مطابق غیر پیش آنے والی ہیں، یہودی کے لئے PLMs کے مطابق پیشرفت گزارے گئے ہیں، ان کے درمیان کم اور دور ہیں. مشکل دوگنا ہے۔ پہلے، یہودیوں کے سواروں میں بڑی زبان مدل کی تعلیم کے لئے ان کے انگلیسی کنٹرپاٹوں کے برابر نہیں ہیں۔ دوسرا، اکثر بنچم مارک جو ہبریوی NLP میں پیشرفت کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے موجود ہیں ان کی مورفولوجی حدود کی ضرورت ہے جو استاندارڈ پلم کے نتائج میں موجود نہیں ہیں. اس کام میں ہم دونوں الگوں کو درست کرتے ہیں۔ ہم آلفBERT کو پیش کرتے ہیں، مدرن Hebrews کے لئے ایک بڑی پلم، بڑی آواز کلام پر آموزش کی گئی ہے اور اس سے پہلے ہر ہبری پلم سے بڑی ڈیٹ سٹ کی گئی ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم ایک نور نیورال معماری معماری پیش کریں گے جو موافق قسمتوں کو متوجہ ہونے والکتروں میں کوڈ کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے اس نوی مورفولوژیک رقم پر ایک ارزیابی سوئٹ پیش کریں جو بہت سے کام اور بنچم مارک ہیں جو sentence-level, word-level اور sub-word level تحلیل کرتی ہیں. تمام کاموں پر آلفبرٹ موجود یہوری بنسٹ لینٹوں سے زیادہ استیٹ کی نتائج حاصل کرتا ہے. ہم نے آلفBERT موڈل بنایا ہے، مورفولوژیکی اخراج موڈل، اور ہبریو کا ارزیابی سائٹ ظاہر طور پر موجود ہے، مستقبل ہبریو پلم کی ارزیابی کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Oldingi o'rganilgan tillar modellari (PLMs) tilni o'rganish texnologiya taʼminotini taʼminlashda o'xshash bo'lgan va ko'pchilik ilmiy intellektlarning taʼminotlarini o'rganishga o'xshash mumkin. Name Muammo ikki marta ko'p. First, so far, Hebrew resources for training large language models are not of the same magnitude as their English counterparts.  Ikkinchi marta, Yahudiycha NLP davomida davom etish uchun eng koʻp benchmark kerak. Andoza PLMs natijasida mavjud emas. Bu ishda biz ikkita aspektlarni bog'liqchimiz. Biz AlephBERT, Modern Yahudiston uchun katta PLM (AQSH) tilida o'rganish va oldin hebraanish PLM'dan katta maʼlumot etilgan. Ko'rib, biz novel neyrolik arxituvchisini ko'rib chiqaramiz, bu murojaat qilingan qismlarni o'zgartiradi. Bu yangi morfologik komponentini asosida, biz bir necha vazifalar va benchmarklarning bir necha vazifalar va soʻzning darajasi, soʻzning darajasi va sub-сўз darajasini aniqlash imkoniyatini bajaramiz. Hamma vazifalar bilan AlephBERT taʼminlovchi hebraaniya asosiy satrlaridan keyin holatni qabul qiladi. Biz AlephBERT modelimizni, morfologik chiqarish modelimizni, va yevropacha qiymatning qiymati toʻplami, kelajagi Yahudiycha PLMsni qiymatga ega.", 'vi': 'Các mô- đun ngôn ngữ được huấn luyện lớn đã trở thành tổng hợp trong việc phát triển công nghệ hiểu ngôn ngữ và nằm trong tâm điểm của nhiều tiến bộ trí tuệ nhân tạo. Trong khi những tiến bộ được báo cáo về sử dụng PLM chưa từng có tiền lệ, báo cáo tiến bộ sử dụng PLM cho người Do Thái rất ít. Vấn đề là kép đôi. Thứ nhất, cho đến nay, nguồn tài nguyên của người Do Thái cho việc huấn luyện các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn không có tầm quan trọng như các đối tác Anh. Thứ hai, hầu hết các tiêu chuẩn sẵn sàng để đánh giá sự tiến bộ trong ngôn ngữ Thoát Do Thái đòi hỏi ranh giới lịch sử mà không có trong kết xuất của các PLM tiêu chuẩn. Trong công việc này chúng tôi cải thiện cả hai. Chúng tôi giới thiệu AlephBERT, một PLM lớn cho người Do Thái hiện đại, được đào tạo từ nhiều hơn và một tập tin dữ liệu lớn hơn bất kỳ PLM Do Thái nào trước đây. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi giới thiệu một cấu trúc thần kinh mới phục hồi các phân đoạn lịch sử được mã hóa trong các véc- tơ nhúng tương ứng. Dựa trên thành phần lịch sử mới này, chúng tôi cung cấp một dãy đánh giá gồm nhiều nhiệm vụ và tiêu chuẩn bao gồm các phân tích mức án, mức chữ và mức chữ ngầm. Trên tất cả các công việc, Alejandro có được kết quả tuyệt vời vượt qua nền văn minh Do Thái đương đại. Chúng tôi công khai mô hình AlephBERT, mô hình chiết xuất lịch sử và phòng đánh giá Do Thái của chúng tôi để đánh giá các PLM của người Do Thái.', 'bg': 'Големите предварително обучени езикови модели (ПЛМ) са станали повсеместни в развитието на технологиите за разбиране на езика и са в основата на много напредъци в изкуствения интелект. Докато напредъкът, докладван за английския език, използващ PLMs, е безпрецедентен, докладваните напредъци, използващи PLMs за иврит, са малко и далеч между тях. Проблемът е двоен. Първо, досега еврейските ресурси за обучение на големи езикови модели не са със същата величина като английските си колеги. Второ, повечето показатели, налични за оценка на напредъка в еврейския НЛП, изискват морфологични граници, които не са налични в изхода на стандартните ПЛМ. В тази работа коригираме и двата аспекта. Представяме голям език за съвременен иврит, обучен на по-голям речник и по-голям набор от данни от който и да е иврит преди. Освен това въвеждаме нова невронна архитектура, която възстановява морфологичните сегменти, кодирани в контекстуализирани вграждащи вектори. Въз основа на този нов морфологичен компонент предлагаме набор от оценки, състоящ се от множество задачи и показатели, които обхващат анализи на ниво изречение, ниво дума и ниво под дума. При всички задачи Алефберт получава най-съвременни резултати отвъд съвременните еврейски базови линии. Ние правим нашия модел на АлефBERT, морфологичния модел на екстракция и комплекта за оценка на еврейския език публично достъпни, за оценка на бъдещите еврейски PLMs.', 'nl': "Grote Pre-getrainde Taalmodellen (PLM's) zijn alomtegenwoordig geworden in de ontwikkeling van taalbegrijpingstechnologie en liggen aan de basis van vele vooruitgang op het gebied van kunstmatige intelligentie. Hoewel vooruitgang gerapporteerd voor Engels met behulp van PLM's ongekend is, zijn gerapporteerde vooruitgang met PLM's voor Hebreeuws weinig en ver tussen. Het probleem is tweeledig. Ten eerste zijn Hebreeuwse middelen voor het trainen van grote taalmodellen tot nu toe niet van dezelfde omvang als hun Engelse tegenhangers. Ten tweede vereisen de meeste benchmarks die beschikbaar zijn om vooruitgang in Hebreeuws NLP te evalueren morfologische grenzen die niet beschikbaar zijn in de output van standaard PLM's. In dit werk verhelpen we beide aspecten. We presenteren AlephBERT, een grote PLM voor Modern Hebreeuws, getraind op grotere woordenschat en een grotere dataset dan enige Hebreeuwse PLM voorheen. Bovendien introduceren we een nieuwe neurale architectuur die de morfologische segmenten herstelt die gecodeerd zijn in contextualiseerde embedding vectoren. Op basis van deze nieuwe morfologische component bieden we een evaluatiesuite aan bestaande uit meerdere taken en benchmarks die betrekking hebben op analyse op zin-, woord- en subwoordniveau. Bij alle taken behaalt AlephBERT state-of-the-art resultaten die verder gaan dan hedendaagse Hebreeuwse basislijnen. We maken ons AlephBERT-model, het morfologische extractiemodel en de Hebreeuwse evaluatiesuite openbaar beschikbaar voor het evalueren van toekomstige Hebreeuwse PLM's.", 'hr': 'Veliki predobučeni jezički modeli (PLMs) postali su svuda u razvoju tehnologije razumijevanja jezika i ležali u srcu mnogih umjetnih napredova inteligencije. Iako su napredak prijavljeni za engleski primjenu PLMs nepredvidljivi, prijavljeni napredak s primjenom PLMs za hebrejski su malo i daleko između njih. Problem je dva puta. Prvo, do sada, hebrejske resurse za obuku velikih jezičkih modela nisu isto veličine kao i njihovi engleski kolege. Drugo, većina kriterija dostupnih za procjenu napreda na hebrejskom NLP zahtijeva morfološke granice koje nisu dostupne u izlazu standardnih PLMs-a. U ovom poslu ćemo srediti obje aspekte. Predstavljamo AlephBERT, veliki PLM za moderni hebrejski, obučen na većem riječniku i većem sastavu podataka od bilo kojeg hebrejskog PLM ranije. Osim toga, predstavljamo novu neuralnu arhitekturu koja oporavlja morfološke segmente kodirane u kontekstualiziranim ugrađenim vektorima. Na temelju ovog novog morfološkog komponenta nudimo apartman za procjenu koji se sastoji od višestrukih zadataka i kriterija koji pokrivaju razinu rečenica, razinu riječi i analize razine podriječi. Na svim zadacima, AlephBERT dobiva rezultate umjetnosti izvan savremenih hebrejskih osnovnih linija. Učinimo naš AlephBERT model, morfološki model ekstrakcije i hebrejski apartman za procjenu budućih hebrejskih PLMs.', 'de': 'Groﾃ歹 Pre-Trained Language Models (PLMs) sind in der Entwicklung von Sprachverstﾃ､ndnistechnologien allgegenwﾃ､rtig und bilden das Herzstﾃｼck vieler Fortschritte in der kﾃｼnstlichen Intelligenz. Wﾃ､hrend Fortschritte, die fﾃｼr Englisch mit PLMs gemeldet werden, beispiellos sind, sind die gemeldeten Fortschritte mit PLMs fﾃｼr Hebrﾃ､isch nur wenige und weit entfernt. Das Problem ist zweifach. Erstens sind hebrﾃ､ische Ressourcen fﾃｼr das Training groﾃ歹r Sprachmodelle bisher nicht von der gleichen Grﾃｶﾃ歹 wie ihre englischen Pendants. Zweitens erfordern die meisten verfﾃｼgbaren Benchmarks, um Fortschritte im hebrﾃ､ischen NLP zu bewerten, morphologische Grenzen, die in der Ausgabe von Standard-PLMs nicht verfﾃｼgbar sind. In dieser Arbeit beheben wir beide Aspekte. Wir prﾃ､sentieren AlephBERT, ein groﾃ歹s PLM fﾃｼr modernes Hebrﾃ､isch, trainiert auf einem grﾃｶﾃ歹ren Vokabular und einem grﾃｶﾃ歹ren Datensatz als jedes andere PLM fﾃｼr Hebrﾃ､isch zuvor. Darﾃｼber hinaus stellen wir eine neuartige neuronale Architektur vor, die die morphologischen Segmente wiederherstellt, die in kontextualisierten Einbettungsvektoren kodiert sind. Basierend auf dieser neuen morphologischen Komponente bieten wir eine Evaluationssuite an, die aus mehreren Aufgaben und Benchmarks besteht, die Analysen auf Satz-, Wort- und Unterwortebene abdecken. Bei allen Aufgaben erzielt AlephBERT State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse jenseits zeitgenﾃｶssischer hebrﾃ､ischer Grundlagen. Wir stellen unser AlephBERT-Modell, das morphologische Extraktionsmodell und die hebrﾃ､ische Evaluationssuite zur Bewertung zukﾃｼnftiger hebrﾃ､ischer PLMs ﾃｶffentlich zur Verfﾃｼgung.', 'da': "Store Pre-Training Language Models (PLM'er) er blevet allestedsnærværende i udviklingen af sprogforståelsesteknologi og ligger i hjertet af mange kunstige intelligens fremskridt. Mens fremskridt rapporteret for engelsk ved hjælp af PLM er hidtil uset, er rapporterede fremskridt ved hjælp af PLM til hebraisk få og langt imellem. Problemet er dobbelt. For det første er hebraiske ressourcer til uddannelse af store sprogmodeller indtil videre ikke af samme størrelse som deres engelske modstykker. For det andet kræver de fleste tilgængelige benchmarks til evaluering af fremskridt i hebraisk NLP morfologiske grænser, som ikke er tilgængelige i output af standard PLM. I dette arbejde afhjælper vi begge aspekter. Vi præsenterer AlephBERT, en stor PLM til moderne hebraisk, trænet i større ordforråd og et større datasæt end nogen hebraisk PLM før. Desuden introducerer vi en ny neural arkitektur, der gendanner de morfologiske segmenter, der er kodet i kontekstualiserede indlejringsvektorer. Baseret på denne nye morfologiske komponent tilbyder vi en evalueringspakke bestående af flere opgaver og benchmarks, der dækker sætningsniveau, ordniveau og underordsniveau analyser. På alle opgaver opnår AlephBERT topmoderne resultater ud over nutidens hebraiske basislinjer. Vi gør vores AlephBERT model, den morfologiske ekstraktionsmodel og den hebraiske evalueringssuite offentligt tilgængelig til evaluering af fremtidige hebraiske PLM'er.", 'id': 'Model Bahasa Terlatih Terbesar (PLM) telah menjadi luas di mana-mana dalam pengembangan teknologi pemahaman bahasa dan berbaring di jantung banyak kemajuan intelijen buatan. Sementara kemajuan yang dilaporkan untuk bahasa Inggris menggunakan PLM tidak terdahulu, kemajuan yang dilaporkan menggunakan PLM untuk bahasa Hebrew adalah sedikit dan jauh antara. Masalahnya dua kali lipat. Pertama, sejauh ini, sumber daya Yahudi untuk melatih model bahasa besar tidak sebesar rekan Inggris mereka. Kedua, kebanyakan benchmarks yang tersedia untuk mengevaluasi kemajuan dalam NLP Ibrani membutuhkan batas morfologi yang tidak tersedia dalam output PLM standar. Dalam pekerjaan ini kita memperbaiki kedua aspek. Kami memperkenalkan AlephBERT, PLM besar untuk Hebrew Modern, dilatih pada vocabulari yang lebih besar dan dataset yang lebih besar dari mana pun PLM Hebrew sebelumnya. Selain itu, kami memperkenalkan arsitektur saraf yang baru yang memulihkan segmen morfologi yang dikodeksi dalam vektor embedding kontekstualisasi. Berdasarkan komponen morfologi baru ini kami menawarkan suite evaluasi yang terdiri dari beberapa tugas dan benchmarks yang meliputi tingkat kalimat, tingkat kata dan tingkat bawah kata analisis. Dalam semua tugas, AlephBERT mendapatkan hasil terbaik di luar garis dasar Ibrani kontempor. Kami membuat model AlephBERT kami, model ekstraksi morfologis, dan suite evaluasi Yahudi tersedia publik, untuk mengevaluasi PLM Yahudi masa depan.', 'ko': '언어 이해 기술의 발전에서 대형 예비훈련 언어모델(PLM)은 어디에나 존재하고 많은 인공지능 발전의 핵심이 되었다.PLMs를 사용한 영어에 대한 연구는 전대미문의 진전을 보였지만 PLMs를 사용한 히브리어에 대한 연구는 거의 진전되지 않았다.문제는 두 가지 방면이 있다.우선 지금까지 대형 언어 모델을 훈련하는 데 사용된 히브리어 자원은 영어 자원과 규모가 같지 않다.그 다음으로 히브리어 NLP의 진전을 평가하는 데 사용되는 대부분의 기준은 형태학적 경계가 필요하며 이것은 표준 PLM의 출력에서 사용할 수 없다.이 업무에서 우리는 이 두 방면을 보충했다.AlephBERT를 소개했는데 이것은 현대 히브리어를 대상으로 하는 대형 PLM으로 이전의 어떤 히브리어 PLM보다 더 큰 어휘량과 더 큰 데이터 집합을 필요로 한다.그 밖에 우리는 상하문에 벡터에 삽입된 형태의 부분을 복원할 수 있는 새로운 신경 구조를 소개했다.이 새로운 형태 성분을 바탕으로 우리는 여러 가지 임무와 기준을 포함하여 문장급, 단어급과 하위 단어급 분석을 포함하는 평가 세트를 제공했다.모든 임무에서, 알레버트는 당대 히브리어의 기선을 뛰어넘는 최신 성과를 거두었다.우리는 미래의 히브리어 PLM을 평가하기 위한 AlephBERT 모델, 형태학 추출 모델과 히브리어 평가 키트를 공개했다.', 'sw': 'Mkubwa wa Modeli za Lugha zilizofundishwa kabla (PLMs) umekuwa na ushirikiano katika maendeleo ya teknolojia ya kuelewa lugha na kudanganya kwenye moyo wa maendeleo mengi ya ubunifu. While advances reported for English using PLMs are unprecedented, reported advances using PLMs for Hebrew are few and far between.  Tatizo ni mara mbili. Kwanza, mpaka sasa, rasilimali za Ki-Hebrew kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya mifano makubwa ya lugha hazina ukubwa sawa na wenzao wa Kiingereza. Pili, benchma nyingi zinazopatikana ili kutathmini maendeleo ya Kibraania NLP zinahitaji mipaka ya kimaadilojia ambayo hayapatikana katika matokeo ya PLMs wa standard. Katika kazi hii tunatunza mambo yote. Tunawasilisha AlephBERT, PLM kubwa kwa Kihebu cha Modern, tukifundishwa kwa lugha kubwa zaidi na takwimu kubwa zaidi ya PLM yoyote ya Kibraania kabla. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha ujenzi wa kitaifa wa neura unaoboresha vipengele vya kimaadilojia vilivyowekwa katika vectors zilizotengenezwa. Kutokana na kipengele hiki kipya cha morphological tunatoa kituo cha uchunguzi kinachojumuisha kazi mbalimbali na bendera ambacho huzungumzia kiwango cha hukumu, kiwango cha maneno na uchambuzi wa ngazi za maneno. Katika kazi zote, AlephBERT anapata matokeo ya sanaa zaidi ya misingi ya Kibraania ya sasa. Tunafanya mifano yetu ya AlephBERT, modeli ya utekelezaji wa kisiasa, na suita la uchunguzi wa KiHebrew kinapatikana hadharani, kwa ajili ya kutathmini Biblia za Kibraania.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبان بزرگ (PLMs) در توسعه تکنولوژی درک زبان به همه جا تبدیل شده\u200cاند و در قلب\u200cهای پیشرفت\u200cهای هوش\u200cهای هنری بسیاری دراز می\u200cکنند. در حالی که پیشرفت برای انگلیسی با استفاده از PLMs گزارش داده شده است، گزارش داده شده است که پیشرفت با استفاده از PLMs برای ابریشمی کم و دور است. مشکل دو برابر است. اول، تا حالا، منابع هبری برای آموزش مدل های زبان بزرگ از همان بزرگی که همکاران انگلیسی هستند نیستند. دوم، بیشترین نقشه\u200cهای موجود برای ارزیابی پیشرفت در NLP Hebrew نیاز به مرزهای مورفولوژیکی است که در نتیجه PLMs استاندارد دسترسی ندارند. در این کار هر دو قسمت را درست می کنیم. ما AlephBERT را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، PLM بزرگ برای ابریشمی مدرن، آموزش یافته در کلمات بزرگ و یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای بزرگتر از هر PLM ابریشمی قبل. و به علاوه، ما یک معماری عصبی روانی را معرفی می کنیم که بخش های مورفولوژیک را در ویکتورهای متوسط پیدا می کند. بر اساس این قسمت مورفولوژیکی جدید، ما یک سوئت ارزیابی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از کار\u200cهای چندین و برچسب\u200cها وجود دارد که سطح جمله، سطح کلمات و تحلیل سطح زیر کلمات را می\u200cپوشاند. در تمام وظیفه\u200cها، آلفبرت نتیجه\u200cهای ایالت هنری را فراتر از خط\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای یهودیی مدرن می\u200cگیرد. ما مدل الفBERT خود را، مدل استخراج مورفولوژیکی و suite ارزیابی ابریویی را به طور عمومی در دسترس می دهیم، برای ارزیابی PLMs ابریویی آینده.', 'tr': "Uly 철흫체nden bilim ta첵첵arlanan dil nusgalary (PLMs) dil d체힊체n체p teknolojisini흫 geli힊mesinde hemi힊e bolup ge챌irdi we birn채챌e sany zekat geli힊melerini흫 첵체z체ne oturyl첵ardy. I흫lis챌e PLM ullan첵an 철챰체nden a첵dyl힊y 첵aly, 첵채h체d챌e PLM ullan첵an 철흫체nden b채ri az we uzakda. Mesele ikinji gezek. Ilkinji, h채zir챌e, uly dil nusgalary okuw etmek 체챌in i흫lis챌e nusgalary bilen me흫ze힊 d채ldir. Ikinji, i첵br dili NLP'da 첵eti힊iklik 첵체ze 챌ykmak 체챌in el첵eterli kalamlar standart PLMsi흫 챌izgisinde ula힊an morfolojik sahalary gerek. Biz bu i힊de her iki aspekti 챌철z첵채ris. Biz AlephBERT'i, Modern 횦채h체d챌e 체챌in uly PLM g철rkezil첵채ris. 횜흫 채hli 첵체d챌e sany uly s철zleri we uly sany hy첵aly PLM-den ullan첵arys. Ayr캇ca, contextualized i챌eri giren vekt철rlerde kodlanm캇힊 morfolojik segmentleri geli힊tirir. Bu t채ze morfolojik komponenti흫 체st체nde guruldu휓umuz 챌yky힊 takmynasyny we 챌yky힊 edilen 챌철z체mler, s철zler derejesi we alt s철zler derejesi 챌철z체mlerini ta첵첵arlayan 챌yky힊 takmynasyny teklip ed첵채ris. Hemme zada AlephBERT g체n채ki 첵채h체d챌e baselini흫 durumyny 체st체nde bol첵ar. Biz AlefBERT nusgasymyzy, morfolojik ga첵힊artma nusgasyny we 첵채h체d챌e de흫lemek 체챌in gelejekde 첵채h체d챌e PLMsini de흫lemek 체챌in edip bil첵채ris.", 'sq': 'Modelet e mëdha të paratrajnuara të gjuhës (PLM) janë bërë gjithandej në zhvillimin e teknologjisë së kuptimit të gjuhës dhe janë në zemrën e shumë përparimeve të inteligjencës artificiale. Ndërsa përparimet e raportuara për anglishtin duke përdorur PLM janë të pashpejtuara, përparimet e raportuara duke përdorur PLM për hebrewin janë pak dhe shumë larg midis tyre. Problemi është i dyfishtë. Së pari, deri tani, burimet hebraike për trajnimin e modeleve të mëdha gjuhësh nuk janë të njëjtën madhësi si homologët e tyre angleze. Së dyti, shumica e parametrave në dispozicion për të vlerësuar përparimin në NLP hebre kërkojnë kufij morfologjik që nuk janë në dispozicion në daljen e PLM-ve standarde. In this work we remedy both aspects.  Ne paraqesim AlephBERT, një PLM të madhe për Hebrenjtë Modern, të stërvitur në fjalorë më të madh dhe një set të dhënash më të madhe se çdo PLM Hebrenj më parë. Moreover, we introduce a novel neural architecture that recovers the morphological segments encoded in contextualized embedding vectors.  Bazuar në këtë komponent morfologjik të ri ne ofrojmë një suite vlerësimi që përbëhet nga detyra të shumta dhe norma që mbulojnë analizat e nivelit të fjalës, nivelit të fjalës dhe nivelit të nënfjalës. Në të gjitha detyrat, AlephBERT merr rezultate më të larta përtej linjave bazë bashkëkohore hebre. Ne e bëjmë modelin tonë AlephBERT, modelin e nxjerrjes morfologjike dhe suitën e vlerësimit hebraik në dispozicion publik, për vlerësimin e PLM të ardhshme hebraike.', 'hy': 'Մեծ նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները (PLM) ամենուրեք են դառնում լեզվի հասկանալու տեխնոլոգիաների զարգացման մեջ և գտնվում են արհեստական ինտելեկտը բազմաթիվ առաջընթացների սիրտը: Մինչդեռ անգլերենի համար PLM օգտագործվող առաջխաղացումները աննախադեպ են, հայտարարված առաջխաղացումները՝ օգտագործելով PLM-ներ եբրայի համար քիչ են և հեռու են: The problem is twofold.  Առաջինը, մինչ այժմ, եբրայեցին ռեսուրսները մեծ լեզվի մոդելների ուսուցման համար նույն չափի չեն, ինչ իրենց անգլերեն գործընկերները: Երկրորդ, եբրայի ՆԼՊ-ի առաջընթացը գնահատելու համար հասանելի համեմատական նշանների մեծ մասը պահանջում է մորֆոլոգիական սահմաններ, որոնք հասանելի չեն ստանդարտ PLM-ների արտադրության մեջ: Այս աշխատանքում մենք լուծում ենք երկու ասպեկտները: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ԱլեֆԲերթը, ժամանակակից եբրայի համար մեծ PLM-ը, որը պատրաստված է ավելի մեծ բառարանում և ավելի մեծ տվյալների համակարգով, քան ցանկացած եբրայի PLM-ը: Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որը վերականգնում է մորֆոլոգիական սեգմերները, որոնք կոնտեքստիալ ներդրող վեկտորներում են: Հաշվի առնելով այս նոր մորֆոլոգիական բաղադրիչը, մենք առաջարկում ենք գնահատման համակարգ, որը կազմված է բազմաթիվ առաջադրանքներից և հարաբերականներից, որոնք ներառում են նախադասությունների, բառերի և ենթաբառերի մակարդակի Բոլոր առաջադրանքներում Ալեֆբերթը ստանում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ, որոնք դուրս են գալիս ժամանակակից եբրայեցի հիմքերից: Մենք հանրային հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր Ալեֆբերտի մոդելը, մորֆոլոգիական վերացման մոդելը և եբրայի գնահատման համակարգը ապագա եբրայի PLM-ների գնահատման համար:', 'af': "Groot voorafgevorderde Taal Modelle (PLMs) het omheen geword in die ontwikkeling van taal verstandige teknologie en lê by die hart van baie kunstenaarde inteligensie vorderings. Alhoewel voorspoedings vir Engels gebruik van PLMs is onvoorspoedig, raporteer voorspoedings gebruik PLMs vir Hebreeus is min en ver tussen. Die probleem is twee ou. Eerste, tot so toe, Hebreeus hulpbronne vir die onderwerp van groot taal modele is nie van dieselfde groot groot groot as hul Engelske kunstenaars nie. Tweede, mees benchmarke beskikbaar om vordering in Hebreefs NLP te evalueer benodig morfologiese grense wat nie beskikbaar is in die uitvoer van standaard PLMs. In hierdie werk herstel ons beide aspekte. Ons voorsien AlephBERT, 'n groot PLM vir Moderne Hebreeus, onderrig op groter woordeboek en 'n groter datastel as enige Hebreese PLM voor. Maar ons introduseer 'n nuwe neurale arkitektuur wat die morfologiese segmente herstel wat in contextualiseerde inbêring vektore gekodeer is. Op hierdie nuwe morfologiese komponent gebruik ons 'n evalueringssuite wat bestaan van veelvuldige taak en benchmarke wat voorkom setvlak, woord vlak en subwoord vlak analiseer. Op alle opdragte kry AlephBERT state-of-the-art resultate buite contemporary Hebrew baselines. Ons maak ons AlephBERT model, die morfologiese uittrekking model, en die Hebreeus evalueringssuite openlik beskikbaar om toekomstige Hebreeus PLMs te evalueer.", 'am': 'ትልቁ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል (PLMs) ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ቴክኖጂ በመፍጠር እና በብዙ አዳማሚ የጥበብ ማስታወቂያው ፍላጎት ውስጥ ተሳሳተ፡፡ የኢንጂልኛ ግንኙነት የPLMs በመጠቀም የፊደል ጉዳይ ሳይሆን፣ በዕብራይስጥ የPLMs ለመጠቀም የዕብራይስጥ ግንኙነት ጥቂቶች እና ሩቅ ናቸው፡፡ መከራው ሁለት እጥፍ ነው። አስቀድሞ፣ እስከ አሁን ድረስ የዕብራይስጥ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለማስተማር ሀብት እንደ እንግሊዘኛ ተቃዋሚዎች አይደሉም፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ የዕብራይስጥ NLP ግንኙነትን ለማረጋገጥ በብዙዎቹ benchmarks በዕብራይስጥ የPLMs ውጤት ውስጥ ያልተገኘ የሞፎሎጂ ዳርቻ ያስፈልጋል። በዚህ ሥራ ሁለቱን ጉዳዮች እናድጋለን:: አሌፍBERT፣ አዲስ ዕብራይስጥ ላይ ታላቅ PLM እና ከዚህ በፊት ከዕብራይስጥ PLM የሚበልጠውን እና ከትልቅ የዳታ ሰርሰት እናቀርባለን፡፡ ደግሞም የዘላለም የኔትራዊ አካውንት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህንን አዲስ ዶሮፎሎጂ ክፍል በተመሳሳይ፣ የቃላት ደረጃ፣ የቃላት ደረጃ እና ትክክለኛ ቃላት የሚያስተምር በብዛት ስራዎችን እና የአሰናክል ገጽ እና አሰናክራለን፡፡ በሁሉም ስራ ላይ AlephBERT በአሁኑ ጊዜ ከዕብራይስጥ ደብዳቤዎች ውጤቶች በላይ የሀገር-የ-art ውጤቶች ያገኛል፡፡ የዕብራዊው የዕብራይስጥ PLMs በመጠቀም ግልፅ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Büyük əvvəl təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri (PLMs) dilləri anlama teknolojisinin təhsil edilməsində hərəkətsiz oldular və bir çox sanatlı istihbarat öyüd-nəsihətlərinin qəlbində otururlar. İbrahim üçün PLMs vasitəsilə İngilizce üçün xəbərdar edilən avanslar görmədikləri halda, İbrahim üçün PLMs vasitəsilə çox az və çox uzaqdır. Problem iki keçmişdir. İlk dəfə, böyük dil modellərini təhsil etmək üçün heybir kaynaqları İngilizə yoldaşları ilə eyni böyüklük deyildir. İkincisi, İbrahim NLP'də təcrübəsini değerləşdirmək üçün mümkün olan çox benchmarklar standart PLMs çıxımında faydalanmayan morfolojik sınırları lazımdır. Bu işdə hər ikisini təmizləyirik. Biz AlephBERT'i, Modern Hebrew üçün böyük PLM təhsil edirik, daha böyük sözlər və daha böyük məlumatlar qurulmuşdur. Daha sonra, bir yeni nöral arhitektür təşkil edirik ki, müxtəlif in şa vektörlərdə kodlanmış morfolojik segmentlərini geri qaytarır. Bu yeni morfolojik komponent üzərində təklif edirik ki, cümlələr səviyyəsini, sözlər səviyyəsini və altı sözlər səviyyəsini analizəyən çoxlu işlər və benchmarklardan olub. Bütün işlərdə AlephBERT günümüzdeki İbrahim səhifələrindən art ıq müxtəlif sonuçlarını alır. Biz AlephBERT modeliyimizi, morfolojik çıxarma modeliyimizi, həmçinin gələcək İbrahim PLMsini değerləşdirmək üçün hebralı değerləşdirmə modeliyimizi yayınlaşdırırıq.", 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মোডেল (পিএলএমএস) ভাষা বুঝতে প্রযুক্তির উন্নয়ন এবং অনেক শৈল্পিক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নয়নের হৃদয়ে মিথ্যা বলেছে। পিএলএমএস ব্যবহার করে ইংরেজির জন্য অগ্রগতির প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করা হয়েছে কিন্তু হিব্রুর জন্য পিএলএমএস ব্যবহার করে পিএলএমএস এর উন সমস্যা দুইবার। প্রথমত, এখন পর্যন্ত, বিশাল ভাষার মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য হিব্রু সম্পদ তাদের ইংরেজী প্রতিপক্ষের মতো একই ধরনের মানে নয়। দ্বিতীয়, হিব্রুয় এনএলপিতে অগ্রগতি মানানোর জন্য বেশীরভাগ বেনমার্ক প্রয়োজন যা স্ট্যান্ডার্ড পিএলএমএস-এর আউটপুটে পাওয়া যায়নি। In this work we remedy both aspects.  আমরা আধুনিক হিব্রুর জন্য একটি বড় পিএলএম উপস্থাপন করছি আলফ্বার্ট, যিনি পূর্বে হিব্রু পিএলমের চেয়ে বড় শব্দভাণ্ডারে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদা এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি উপন্যাস নিউরেল কাঠামো পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা প্রতিযোগিতায় বিভিন্ন ভেক্টরে এনকোড করা মোরফোলিকাল বিভাগ পুনরুদ্ এই নতুন মরোফোলিক্যাল কম্পোনেন্টের ভিত্তিতে আমরা একটি মূল্যায়ন স্যুট প্রদান করি যার মধ্যে রয়েছে বেশ কিছু কাজ এবং বেনম্যাক্কের যেগুলোর মধ্যে যা  সকল কাজের মধ্যে আলেফবার্টি বর্তমান হিব্রু বেসাইনের বাইরে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল পায়। আমরা আমাদের আলেফবেরেট মডেল, মরোফোলিক্যাল বিনিময় মডেল এবং হিব্রু মূল্যের স্যুট প্রকাশ্যে প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে, ভবিষ্যত হিব্রু প', 'bs': 'Veliki predobučeni jezički modeli (PLMs) postali su svuda u razvoju tehnologije razumijevanja jezika i ležali u srcu mnogih umjetnih napredova inteligencije. Iako su napredak prijavljeni za engleski korištenje PLMs neprecedentni, prijavljeni napredak korištenja PLMs za hebrejski su malo i daleko između njih. Problem je dva puta. Prvo, do sada, hebrejske resurse za obuku velikih jezičkih modela nisu isto veličine kao i njihovi engleski kolege. Drugo, većina kriterija dostupnih za procjenu napreda na hebrejskom NLP zahtijeva morfološke granice koje nisu dostupne u izlazu standardnih PLMs-a. U ovom poslu ćemo srediti obje aspekte. Predstavljamo AlephBERT, veliki PLM za moderni hebrejski, obučen na većem rečniku i većem setu podataka od bilo kojeg hebrejskog PLM ranije. Osim toga, predstavljamo novu neuralnu arhitekturu koja oporavlja morfološke segmente kodirane u kontekstualiziranim ugrađenim vektorima. Na osnovu ovog novog morfološkog komponenta nudimo apartman za procjenu koji se sastoji od višestrukih zadataka i kriterija koji pokrivaju analizu nivoa rečenica, nivoa riječi i nivoa podriječi. Na svim zadacima, AlephBERT dobija rezultate umjetnosti izvan savremenih hebrejskih osnovnih linija. Učinimo naš AlephBERT model, morfološki model ekstrakcije, i hebrejski apartman za procjenu budućih hebrejskih PLMs.', 'cs': 'Velké předškolené jazykové modely (PLM) se staly všudypřítomnými ve vývoji technologií porozumění jazyků a leží v srdci mnoha pokroků umělé inteligence. Zatímco pokroky hlášené v angličtině pomocí PLM jsou bezprecedentní, hlášené pokroky používající PLM pro hebrejštinu jsou jen málo a daleko mezi nimi. Problém je dvojí. Za prvé, hebrejské zdroje pro výcvik velkých jazykových modelů zatím nejsou stejné velikosti jako jejich anglické protějšky. Za druhé, většina měřítek dostupných pro hodnocení pokroku v hebrejštině NLP vyžaduje morfologické hranice, které nejsou dostupné ve výstupu standardních PLM. V této práci napravíme oba aspekty. Představujeme AlephBERT, velký PLM pro moderní hebrejštinu, trénovaný na větší slovní zásobě a větší datové sadě než jakýkoliv hebrejština PLM předtím. Navíc představujeme novou neuronovou architekturu, která obnovuje morfologické segmenty kódované v kontextualizovaných vkládacích vektorech. Na základě této nové morfologické komponenty nabízíme hodnotící sadu sestávající z několika úkolů a benchmarků, které pokrývají analýzy na úrovni věty, slova a podslova. Při všech úkolech získává AlephBERT nejmodernější výsledky nad rámec současné hebrejské základní linie. Pro hodnocení budoucích hebrejských PLM zpřístupníme náš AlephBERT model, morfologický extrakční model a hebrejskou evaluační sadu.', 'ca': "Els grans models de llenguatge pré-entrenats (PLM) han esdevingut omnipresents en el desenvolupament de la tecnologia de la comprensió del llenguatge i estan al cor de molts avanços d'intel·ligència artificial. Mentre que els avanços reportats en anglès utilitzant PLM són sense precedents, els avanços reportats en anglès utilitzant PLM en hebreu són pocs i molt diferents. El problema és doble. Primer, fins ara, els recursos hebreus per formar grans models de llenguatge no són de la mateixa magnitud que els seus homosexuals anglesos. Segon, la majoria dels punts de referència disponibles per avaluar el progrés en el NLP hebreu requereixen límits morfològics que no estan disponibles en la producció de PLM standard. En aquesta feina resolem ambdós aspectes. Presentam AlephBERT, un gran PLM per a Hebreu Modern, entrenat en un vocabulari més gran i un conjunt de dades més gran que qualsevol PLM hebreu abans. A més, introduïm una nova arquitectura neuronal que recupera els segments morfològics codificats en vectors d'incorporació contextualitzats. Sobre la base d'aquest nou component morfològic oferim una sèrie d'evaluació que consisteix en múltiples tasques i punts de referència que cobreixen l'an àlisi de nivell de frases, nivell de paraules i nivell de subparaules. En totes les tasques, AlephBERT obté resultats més avançats que les línies de base contemporàries hebreus. Fem públic el nostre model d'AlephBERT, el model d'extracció morfològica i la suite d'evaluació hebreu, per avaluar els futurs PLM hebreus.", 'et': 'Suured eelõpetatud keelemudelid (PLM) on muutunud keelte mõistmise tehnoloogia arendamisel kõikjal levivaks ja on paljude tehisintellekti edusammudelite keskmes. Kuigi inglise keeles teatatud edusammud PLMide kasutamisel on enneolematud, on teatatud edusammud PLMide kasutamisel heebrea keeles vähe ja kaugel. Probleem on kahekordne. Esiteks ei ole heebrea ressursid suurte keelemudelite koolitamiseks seni sama suured kui inglise keele kolleegid. Teiseks nõuab enamik võrdlusaluseid, mis on kättesaadavad heebrea uue õppekava edusammude hindamiseks, morfoloogilisi piire, mis ei ole standardsete PLMide väljundites kättesaadavad. Selles töös parandame mõlemat aspekti. Esitleme AlephBERT, suur PLM kaasaegse heebrea keele jaoks, mis on koolitatud suurema sõnavara ja suurema andmekogumi kui ükski varem heebrea PLM. Lisaks tutvustame uudset neuraalset arhitektuuri, mis taastab kontekstualiseeritud põhivektorites kodeeritud morfoloogilised segmendid. Sellele uuele morfoloogilisele komponendile tuginedes pakume hindamiskomplekti, mis koosneb mitmest ülesandest ja võrdlusalustest, mis hõlmavad lausetaseme, sõna taseme ja alamsõna taseme analüüse. Kõigi ülesannete täitmisel saab AlephBERT kaasaegsetest heebrea lähtejoontest väljapoole tipptasemel tulemusi. Me teeme oma AlephBERT mudeli, morfoloogilise ekstraheerimise mudeli ja heebrea hindamise komplekti avalikkusele kättesaadavaks tulevaste heebrea PLM-ide hindamiseks.', 'fi': 'Suuret esikoulutetut kielimallit (PLM) ovat tulleet kaikkialle kielen ymmärtämisen teknologian kehittämisessä ja ovat monien tekoälyn kehityksen ytimessä. Vaikka englanninkieliset PLM-menetelmät ovat ennennäkemättömiä, hepreankieliset PLM-menetelmät ovat harvoja ja kaukana toisistaan. Ongelma on kaksitahoinen. Ensinnäkin heprean resurssit suurten kielimallien kouluttamiseen eivät ole toistaiseksi yhtä suuria kuin niiden englanninkieliset vastineet. Toiseksi useimmat vertailukohdat, jotka ovat käytettävissä heprean NLP:n edistymisen arvioimiseksi, edellyttävät morfologisia rajoja, joita ei ole saatavilla standardien PLM:ien tuotoksessa. Tässä työssä korjaamme molemmat näkökohdat. Esittelemme AlephBERT, suuri PLM modernille heprealle, joka on koulutettu suurempaan sanastoon ja suurempaan tietojoukkoon kuin mikään aiemmin heprealainen PLM. Lisäksi esittelemme uuden neuroarkkitehtuurin, joka palauttaa kontekstualisoituihin upotusvektoreihin koodatut morfologiset segmentit. Tämän uuden morfologisen komponentin pohjalta tarjoamme arviointikokonaisuuden, joka koostuu useista tehtävistä ja vertailuarvoista, jotka kattavat lause-, sana- ja alasanatason analyysit. Kaikissa tehtävissä AlephBERT saa huipputason tuloksia nykyheprean perusviivoista. Annamme AlephBERT-mallimme, morfologisen uuttamismallin ja heprean arviointipaketin julkisesti saataville tulevien heprean PLM:ien arvioimiseksi.', 'ha': "@ action: button @ info: whatsthis Mulkin ta sau biyu ne. Kayyan, har a yanzu, ma'anar Yahũdiya ba masu yin amfani da misãlai masu cikin harshe mai girma ba su zama daga girmar da suka zama abõkan Ingiriya. Babu da, ko mafi yawan bangon masu iya amfani da ga tunkuɗe kodi cikin Yahũdãwa na NLP, yana buƙata tsari masu mutfologi da ba'a iya buƙata cikin fitin PLM na daidaita. A cikin wannan aikin da Muke cika dukansu. @ item Spelling dictionary Kayya, za'a fara wani matsayin neural na'ura wanda ke samu da rabon sigogi da aka kodi cikin masu cikin matabbata. Basic kan wannan tsarin mutafalojiki na yanzu, Munã bãyar da shawarar evaluci wanda ke cikin aiki mãsu yawa da shiryoyin bangon da ke rufe-daraja, da ƙan an an-daraja da ƙananan-magana. Ga duk aikin, AlePBERT yana samun state-of-the-art fassarar baƙaƙƙin banners na Hebrew yanzu. We make our AlephBERT model, the morphological extraction model, and the Hebrew evaluation suite publicly available, for evaluating future Hebrew PLMs.", 'sk': 'Veliki predhodno usposobljeni jezikovni modeli (PLM) so postali vsepovsod pri razvoju tehnologije razumevanja jezikov in so v središču številnih napredkov umetne inteligence. Čeprav so napredki, o katerih se poroča za angleščino, ki uporabljajo PLM, neprimerljivi, so poročani napredki, ki uporabljajo PLM za hebrejščino, malo in daleč med njimi. Težava je dvojna. Prvič, do zdaj hebrejski viri za usposabljanje velikih jezikovnih modelov niso enake velikosti kot njihovi angleški kolegi. Drugič, večina referenčnih vrednosti, ki so na voljo za ocenjevanje napredka v hebrejščini NLP, zahteva morfološke meje, ki niso na voljo v izhodišču standardnih PLM. V tem delu popravimo oba vidika. Predstavljamo AlephBERT, velik PLM za sodobno hebrejščino, usposobljen za večji besednjak in večji nabor podatkov kot kateri koli hebrejski PLM prej. Poleg tega predstavljamo novo nevronsko arhitekturo, ki obnovi morfološke segmente, kodirane v kontekstualiziranih vdelanih vektorjih. Na podlagi te nove morfološke komponente ponujamo vrednotenje, ki je sestavljen iz več nalog in referenčnih vrednosti, ki zajemajo analize stavka, besede in podbesede. Pri vseh nalogah AlephBERT pridobi najsodobnejše rezultate, ki presegajo sodobne hebrejske osnovne črte. Naš AlephBERT model, morfološki ekstrakcijski model in hebrejski evalvacijski paket dajemo javnosti na voljo za ocenjevanje prihodnjih hebrejskih PLMs.', 'he': 'מודלים שפות גדולים מאומנים מראש (PLMs) הפכו לכל מקום בפיתוח של טכנולוגיה הבנה שפות ושומרים בלב התקדמות רבות של אינטליגנציה מלאכותית. בעוד התקדמות דווחות לאנגלית בשימוש PLMs הם ללא תקדים, התקדמות דווחות בשימוש PLMs עבור היברית הן מעט ורחק בין. The problem is twofold.  ראשית, עד כה, משאבי היברים לאימון דוגמני שפה גדולים אינם באותו גודל כמו שותפיהם האנגליים. שנית, רוב הנקודות הנוכחים להעריך התקדמות בעברית NLP דורשים גבולות מורפולוגיים שאינם זמינים בתוצאה של PLMs סטנדרטיים. בעבודה הזו אנחנו מתקנים את שני היבטים. אנחנו מציגים את אלפברט, PLM גדול עבור היברי המודרני, מאומן על מילון גדול יותר ומערכת נתונים גדולה יותר מכל PLM היברי בעבר. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מציגים ארכיטקטורה עצבית חדשה שמחזירה את החלקים המורפולוגיים מקודדים בוקטורים קונטוקטוליזציאלים. Based on this new morphological component we offer an evaluation suite consisting of multiple tasks and benchmarks that cover sentence-level, word-level and sub-word level analyses.  על כל המשימות, אלפברט מקבל תוצאות מוקדמות מעבר לקווי הבסיס העבריים contemporary. We make our AlephBERT model, the morphological extraction model, and the Hebrew evaluation suite publicly available, for evaluating future Hebrew PLMs.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་བསླབ་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གཟུགས་རིས། གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་སྔོན་མེད་པའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཞིག་བྱུང་བ་རེད། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་གཉིས་པ་རེད། དང་པོ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན་ནའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིན་ནའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་མིག་རྩལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིན་མེད། Second, most benchmarks available to evaluate progress in Hebrew NLP require morphological boundaries which are not available in the output of standard PLMs. འོན་ཀྱང་། ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དོན་ཚན་གཉིས་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་བཅོས་པ་ཡིན། We present AlephBERT, a large PLM for Modern Hebrew, trained on larger vocabulary and a larger data set than any Hebrew PLM before. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བརྩོན་པ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་གིས་contextualized embedding vectors་ནང་ཕན་ཚུལ Based on this new morphological component we offer an evaluation suite consisting of multiple tasks and benchmarks that cover sentence-level, word-level and sub-word level analyses. ལཱ་གཡོག་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་AlephBERT དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་རྒྱུ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་AlephBERT་གི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': '(PLM) @item Text character set Asem iki sampeyan duwé. Awak dhéwé, dadi, sakjane Hebrew kuwi nggawe model sing luwih banjuré, kuwi jenis-jenis karo ngono kuwi nggolupan Inggris. Sikonde, nggo diangkat-diangkat sing wis ana kanggo deweke nggo langkung banjur ning hebrano NLP soale mplorologik bukani sing ora iso dianggo ngwusubah kedangkat singular PLM Nang negori iki kita lagi nggoleki durung-durung. Awak dhéwé éntuk alefBERT, akeh langgar PLM kanggo ngerggo Hebrew, tukno karo pergambar sing luwih karo data set kuwi nggawe Hebrew PLM kiper. Label Ngawe basa kang kompon sing dumateng akhir buking, kita enyarno nggawe basa luwih karo mulalah sing gawe nggawe dadi seneng dadi lan nggawe barang nggawe Tulung ning alam nggawe tasks, alefBERT bukewang state-of-the-arts dadi wis mulai cara-cara nggawe barang Hebrew. Awak dhéwé nggawe model alefBERT, model sing ngenggo bukané, lan asserti Hebrew tau ngomong basa gambaran, kanggo bisa asserti kanggo ngerasakno Pang Hyraé.'}
{'en': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned ', 'ar': 'تعلم التخيل: دمج التفكير المضاد في الاستدلال العصبي المنفصل', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a imaginar: integrando o pensamento contrafactual no raciocínio discreto neural', 'es': 'Aprender a imaginar: integración del pensamiento contrafactual en el razonamiento discreto neuronal', 'fr': 'Apprendre à imaginer\xa0: intégrer la pensée contrefactuelle dans le raisonnement neuronal discret', 'ja': '想像することを学ぶ：反事実的思考を神経離散的推論に統合する', 'hi': 'कल्पना करने के लिए सीखना: तंत्रिका असतत तर्क में प्रतिवादात्मक सोच को एकीकृत करना', 'zh': '学想象:将反事思维整合到神经离散推理中', 'ru': 'Учимся воображать: Интеграция контрафактивного мышления в нейронное дискретное мышление', 'ga': 'Foghlaim conas Samhlaigh: Smaointeoireacht Fhrithfhíorasach a Chomhtháthú le Réasúnaíocht Néar-Scoite', 'ka': 'შესწავლობა დაფიქრობის შესახებ: ინტერგურაცია კონტრექალური ფიქრობა ნეირალური დისკრეტური მიზეზის შესახებ', 'hu': 'Tanulás elképzelni: A hamisított gondolkodás integrálása a neurális diszkrét érvelésben', 'el': 'Μαθαίνοντας να φαντάζεσαι: Ενσωματώνοντας την πλαστή σκέψη στην Νευρική Διακριτική Λογιστική', 'kk': 'Кескіндіру үшін оқыту: Невралдық дискреттің себептеріне қарсы қарсы ойлау', 'it': 'Imparare a immaginare: integrare il pensiero contraffatto nella ragione discreta neurale', 'lt': 'Mokymasis įsivaizduoti: klastojo mąstymo integravimas į neurologinį diskretą', 'mk': 'Научи да замислиш: Интегрирање на лажно мислење во неурално дискретно размислување', 'ml': 'ചിന്തിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത്: നെയൂറല്\u200d ഡിസ്ക്രീറ്റ് വീണ്ടും ചിന്തിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കൂട്ടുക', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk membayangkan: Integrating Counterfactual Thinking in Neural Discrete Reasoning', 'mt': 'Tagħlim biex Jimmaġinaw: L-integrazzjoni tal-Ħsib Falz fir-Raġunar Diskret Newrali', 'mn': 'төсөөлөх суралцах нь: сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөө', 'no': 'Læring for å gjera bilete: integrerer kontraferdige tenking i nøyraldiskrete grunn', 'pl': 'Uczenie się wyobrażać: Integracja myślenia fałszywego w neuronowym dyskretnym rozumowaniu', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a imagina: Integrarea gândirii contrafăcute în raționarea discretă neurală', 'sr': 'Naučenje da zamislite: integrisanje protivnih faktora razmišljanja u neuronskom diskretnom razlogu', 'si': 'හිතාගන්න ඉගෙනගන්න: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හිතාගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada ka fekerka: Inta la qabsashada fikrada xisaabta', 'sv': 'Lär dig att föreställa dig: Integrera falskt tänkande i neural diskret resonemang', 'ta': 'கற்றுக்கொள்ள கற்று', 'ur': 'تصور کرنے کے لئے سیکھا جاتا ہے: کنٹر فارغ فکرات کو نیورال دیسکریٹ ریسونینگ میں اکنوٹر کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': "Tasavvur qilish o'rganadi: Neural Discretion Reading", 'vi': 'Học cách tưởng tượng: tích hợp suy nghĩ ngược về suy nghĩ', 'bg': 'Научете се да си представите: интегриране на фалшивото мислене в невралното дискретно разсъждаване', 'da': 'At lære at forestille sig: Integrering af forfalsket tænkning i Neural Discrete Rating', 'hr': 'Naučenje da zamislite: integriranje proizvođača mišljenja u neurodiskretnom razlogu', 'nl': 'Leren je voor te stellen: het integreren van namaakdenken in neurale discrete redenering', 'de': 'Imagination lernen: Falschdenken in neuronale Diskrete Reasoning integrieren', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kufikiria: Kujumuisha Taifa Kufikiri kwa Kihalisi katika Kusoma Uchunguzi wa Karibu', 'ko': '학습 상상: 신경 이산 추리에서 반사실적 사유를 통합시킨다', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن برای تصور کردن: ترکیب فکری کنترل در دلایل دیسکریت عصبی', 'id': 'Belajar untuk membayangkan: Integrating Counterfactual Thinking in Neural Discrete Reasoning', 'tr': 'Gerçekleşmek üçin öwrenmek: Gerçekleşmek Kontrasyny Neural Diskret Reasoning içinde pikirlenmek', 'af': 'Leer om te verbeeld: integreer teenwoordige dink in Neurale diskrete rede', 'am': 'ለማስተማር ትምህርት: የቁጥር ማሳሰብ በኔural Discrete Reading', 'sq': 'Learning to Imagine: Integrating Counterfactual Thinking in Neural Discrete Reasoning', 'az': '䓃볅鿃뱮淉饹椠쎶祲즙湭즙欺⁎쎶牡氠䑩獫牥瑥⁒敡獯湬慲쒱湤愠䍯畮瑥牦慣瑵慬⁄쎼얟쎼湭즙祩⁉湴敧牡瑩潮\u2069渠乥畲慬⁄楳捲整攠剥慳潮楮朊', 'bn': 'কল্পনা করতে শিখা যাচ্ছে: নিউরেল ডিস্ক্রিটের পুনরায় চিন্তা করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Պատկերացնելու սովորելը. կեղծ մտածելը ինտեգրելը', 'bs': 'Naučenje da zamislite: integrisanje protivnih faktora razmišljanja u neuronskom diskretnom razlogu', 'ca': 'Learning to Imagine: Integrating Counterfactual Thinking in Neural Discrete Reasoning', 'cs': 'Naučit se představovat: Integrace padělaného myšlení do nervového diskrétního uvažování', 'et': 'Kujutlema õppimine: võltsitud mõtlemise integreerimine neuroaalsesse diskreetsesse mõtlemisse', 'fi': 'Oppiminen kuvittelemaan: Väärennetyn ajattelun integrointi neurologiseen diskreettiseen järkeilyyn', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'sk': 'Učenje si predstavljati: vključevanje ponarejenega razmišljanja v nevronsko diskretno razmišljanje', 'he': 'ללמוד לדמיין: לשלוף חשיבה מזויפת בהגיון דיסקרטי נוירולי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་བསླབ་པའི་སྐོར་བརྗོད།'}
{'en': 'Modelling prosody variation is critical for synthesizing natural and expressive speech in end-to-end text-to-speech (TTS) systems. In this paper, a cross-utterance conditional VAE (CUC-VAE) is proposed to estimate a posterior probability distribution of the latent prosody features for each phoneme by conditioning on acoustic features, speaker information, and text features obtained from both past and future sentences. At inference time, instead of the standard Gaussian distribution used by VAE, CUC-VAE allows sampling from an utterance-specific prior distribution conditioned on cross-utterance information, which allows the prosody features generated by the TTS system to be related to the context and is more similar to how humans naturally produce prosody. The performance of CUC-VAE is evaluated via a qualitative listening test for naturalness, intelligibility and quantitative measurements, including word error rates and the standard deviation of prosody attributes. Experimental results on LJ-Speech and LibriTTS data show that the proposed CUC-VAE TTS system improves naturalness and prosody diversity with clear margins.', 'ar': 'أظهر الاستدلال العصبي المنفصل (NDR) تقدمًا ملحوظًا في الجمع بين النماذج العميقة والاستدلال المنفصل. ومع ذلك ، وجدنا أن حل NDR الحالي يعاني من انخفاض كبير في الأداء في الأسئلة الافتراضية ، على سبيل المثال "ما هو معدل العائد السنوي إذا تضاعفت الإيرادات في عام 2020". إن مفتاح الإجابة الافتراضية على الأسئلة (HQA) هو التفكير المضاد ، وهو قدرة طبيعية للتفكير البشري ولكنه صعب بالنسبة للنماذج العميقة. في هذا العمل ، ابتكرنا وحدة تعلم التخيل (L2I) ، والتي يمكن دمجها بسلاسة في نماذج NDR لأداء خيال الواقع المضاد غير المرئي. على وجه الخصوص ، نقوم بصياغة التفكير المضاد في خطوتين: 1) تحديد حقيقة التدخل ، و 2) اشتقاق الواقع المضاد من الحقيقة والافتراض ، والتي تم تصميمها كشبكات عصبية. استنادًا إلى TAT-QA ، نقوم ببناء مجموعة بيانات HQA صعبة للغاية مع 8283 سؤالًا افتراضيًا. نحن نطبق L2I المقترح على TAGOP ، وهو الحل الأكثر حداثة على TAT-QA ، للتحقق من عقلانية نهجنا وفعاليته.', 'pt': 'O raciocínio discreto neural (NDR) mostrou um progresso notável na combinação de modelos profundos com raciocínio discreto. No entanto, descobrimos que a solução de NDR existente sofre uma grande queda de desempenho em questões hipotéticas, por exemplo, "qual seria a taxa de retorno anualizada se a receita em 2020 fosse dobrada". A chave para a resposta a perguntas hipotéticas (HQA) é o pensamento contrafactual, que é uma habilidade natural do raciocínio humano, mas difícil para modelos profundos. Neste trabalho, desenvolvemos um módulo Learning to Imagine (L2I), que pode ser perfeitamente incorporado em modelos NDR para realizar a imaginação de contrafactuais não vistos. Em particular, formulamos o pensamento contrafactual em duas etapas: 1) identificar o fato a intervir e 2) derivar o contrafactual do fato e da suposição, que são projetados como redes neurais. Com base no TAT-QA, construímos um conjunto de dados HQA muito desafiador com 8.283 perguntas hipotéticas. Aplicamos a proposta L2I ao TAGOP, a solução de ponta em TAT-QA, validando a racionalidade e eficácia da nossa abordagem.', 'fr': "Le raisonnement neuronal discret (NDR) a fait des progrès remarquables dans la combinaison de modèles profonds et de raisonnement discret. Cependant, nous constatons que la solution NDR existante souffre d'une baisse importante des performances sur des questions hypothétiques, par exemple «\xa0quel serait le taux de rendement annualisé si le chiffre d'affaires en 2020 était doublé\xa0». La clé de la réponse hypothétique aux questions (HQA) est la pensée contrefactuelle, qui est une capacité naturelle du raisonnement humain mais difficile pour les modèles profonds. Dans ce travail, nous concevons un module Learning to Imagine (L2I), qui peut être intégré de manière transparente dans des modèles NDR pour exécuter l'imagination d'un contrefactuel invisible. En particulier, nous formulons la pensée contrefactuelle en deux étapes\xa0: 1) identifier le fait d'intervenir, et 2) déduire le contrefactuel du fait et de l'hypothèse, qui sont conçus comme des réseaux de neurones. Sur la base du TAT-QA, nous construisons un ensemble de données HQA très difficile avec 8 283 questions hypothétiques. Nous appliquons le L2I proposé à TAGOP, la solution de pointe en matière de TAT-QA, en validant la rationalité et l'efficacité de notre approche.", 'es': 'El razonamiento discreto neuronal (NDR) ha demostrado un progreso notable en la combinación de modelos profundos con razonamiento discreto. Sin embargo, descubrimos que la solución NDR existente sufre una gran caída del rendimiento en cuestiones hipotéticas, por ejemplo, «cuál sería la tasa de rendimiento anualizada si los ingresos en 2020 se duplicaran». La clave para la respuesta hipotética a preguntas (HQA) es el pensamiento contrafáctico, que es una habilidad natural del razonamiento humano pero difícil para los modelos profundos. En este trabajo, diseñamos un módulo Learning to Imagine (L2I), que se puede incorporar sin problemas en los modelos NDR para realizar la imaginación de contrafácticos invisibles. En particular, formulamos el pensamiento contrafáctico en dos pasos: 1) identificar el hecho que debe intervenir y 2) derivar lo contrafactual del hecho y el supuesto, que están diseñados como redes neuronales. Basándonos en TAT-QA, construimos un conjunto de datos de HQA muy desafiante con 8283 preguntas hipotéticas. Aplicamos el L2I propuesto a TAGOP, la solución de vanguardia en TAT-QA, que valida la racionalidad y la eficacia de nuestro enfoque.', 'ja': '神経離散推論（ NDR ）は、深層モデルと離散推論を組み合わせることにおいて顕著な進歩を示している。 しかし、既存のNDRソリューションは、例えば「2020年の収益が2倍になった場合、年間収益率は何になるか」といった仮定的な質問で大きなパフォーマンス低下に悩まされていることがわかります。 仮説的質問回答（ HQA ）の鍵は反事実的思考であり、これは人間の推論の自然な能力であるが、深層モデルにとっては困難である。 この研究では、想像するための学習（ L 2 I ）モジュールを考案し、これをNDRモデルにシームレスに組み込んで、見えない反事実の想像を実行することができます。 特に、反事実的思考を2つのステップに分けて定式化する。1 ）介入する事実を特定する。2 ）ニューラルネットワークとして設計された事実と仮定から反事実を導き出す。 TAT - QAに基づいて、8,283の仮説的な質問を含む非常に困難なHQAデータセットを構築します。 提案されたL 2 IをTAT - QAの最先端ソリューションであるTAGOPに適用し、当社のアプローチの合理性と有効性を検証します。', 'zh': '神经离散推理(NDR)将深度与离散推理相合而显进。 然见NDR解决方案在假设性问题大幅性能降者,如"若2020年收入翻一番,年化回报率多少"。 设问(HQA)之要,反事实思,此人之所推自然,而于深度为难。 于此之中,设一学(L2I)模块,当模块无隙而成NDR形,以行不见之想象力。 特分反事为两步驿:1)识干预之实,及2)于事伪推导出反事实,设计为神经网络。 基于TAT-QA,构一挑战性之HQA数集,含8283假。 吾将言L2I用于TATOP,是TAT-QA之最新解决方案也,验吾道之合理性有效性。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका असतत तर्क (एनडीआर) ने असतत तर्क के साथ गहरे मॉडल के संयोजन में उल्लेखनीय प्रगति दिखाई है। हालांकि, हम पाते हैं कि मौजूदा एनडीआर समाधान काल्पनिक प्रश्नों पर बड़े प्रदर्शन ड्रॉप से ग्रस्त है, उदाहरण के लिए "यदि 2020 में राजस्व दोगुना हो गया तो रिटर्न की वार्षिक दर क्या होगी"। काल्पनिक प्रश्न उत्तर (एचक्यूए) की कुंजी प्रतिवादी सोच है, जो मानव तर्क की एक प्राकृतिक क्षमता है लेकिन गहरे मॉडल के लिए मुश्किल है। इस काम में, हम एक लर्निंग टू इमेजिन (एल 2 आई) मॉड्यूल तैयार करते हैं, जिसे अनदेखी की कल्पना करने के लिए एनडीआर मॉडल में मूल रूप से शामिल किया जा सकता है। विशेष रूप से, हम दो चरणों में प्रतिवादात्मक सोच तैयार करते हैं: 1) हस्तक्षेप करने के लिए तथ्य की पहचान करना, और 2) तथ्य और धारणा से प्रतिवादात्मक व्युत्पन्न करना, जो तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के रूप में डिज़ाइन किए गए हैं। टीएटी-क्यूए के आधार पर, हम 8,283 काल्पनिक प्रश्नों के साथ एक बहुत ही चुनौतीपूर्ण एचक्यूए डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं। हम प्रस्तावित L2I को TAGOP पर लागू करते हैं, जो कि TAT-QA पर अत्याधुनिक समाधान है, जो हमारे दृष्टिकोण की तर्कसंगतता और प्रभावशीलता को मान्य करता है।', 'ru': 'Нейронное дискретное мышление (NDR) показало значительный прогресс в сочетании глубоких моделей с дискретным мышлением. Однако мы считаем, что существующее решение для НДР страдает от значительного снижения эффективности по гипотетическим вопросам, например, "какова была бы годовая норма прибыли, если бы выручка в 2020 году была удвоена". Ключом к ответу на гипотетический вопрос (HQA) является контрафактное мышление, которое является естественной способностью человеческого мышления, но трудно для глубоких моделей. В этой работе мы разрабатываем модуль «Учимся воображать» (L2I), который можно легко интегрировать в модели НДР, чтобы реализовать воображение невидимого контрафакта. В частности, мы формулируем контрафактное мышление в два этапа: 1) выявление факта вмешательства и 2) выведение контрафакта из факта и предположения, которые сконструированы как нейронные сети. Основываясь на TAT-QA, мы создали очень сложный набор данных HQA с 8283 гипотетическими вопросами. Мы применяем предлагаемый L2I к TAGOP, современному решению по TAT-QA, подтверждая рациональность и эффективность нашего подхода.', 'ga': 'Tá dul chun cinn suntasach léirithe ag réasúnaíocht scoite néareolaíoch (NDR) maidir le samhlacha domhain a chomhcheangal le réasúnaíocht scoite. Mar sin féin, feicimid go bhfuil titim mhór feidhmíochta ag baint le réiteach NDR atá ann cheana féin ar cheisteanna hipitéiseacha, m.sh. "cad é an ráta toraidh bliantúil a bheadh ann dá ndéanfaí an t-ioncam in 2020 a dhúbailt". Is í an eochair do fhreagairt ceisteanna hipitéiseach (HQA) ná smaointeoireacht fhrithfhíorasach, arb é cumas nádúrtha réasúnaíochta an duine í ach atá deacair do mhúnlaí domhain. Sa saothar seo, ceapaimid modúl Ag Foghlaim conas a Shamhlú (L2I), ar féidir é a ionchorprú gan uaim i múnlaí NDR chun samhlaíocht fhrithfhíorasach nach bhfacthas a fheiceáil a chur i bhfeidhm. Go háirithe, déanaimid smaointeoireacht fhrithfhíorasach a fhoirmliú ina dhá chéim: 1) an fhíric le hidirghabháil a aithint, agus 2) an fhrithfhíoras a dhíorthú ón bhfíric agus ón toimhde, atá deartha mar líonraí néaracha. Bunaithe ar TAT-QA, tógaimid tacar sonraí HQA an-dúshlánach le 8,283 ceist hipitéiseach. Cuirimid an L2I atá molta i bhfeidhm ar TAGOP, an réiteach úrscothach ar TAT-QA, a bhailíochtaíonn réasúntacht agus éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური დისკრეტული პარამენტი (NDR) გამოჩვენეთ შესანიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი დისკრეტული მოდელების გაერთადებაში. მაგრამ ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ მსგავსი NDR პროქცია დიდი გამოყენება ჰიპოტეტიკური კითხვებისგან, მაგალითად, რას იქნება წლის გამოყენება, თუ 2020 წლის მოსახლეობა ექნება. ჰიპოტეტიკური კითხვის გასაღების გასაღები (HQA) არის მუშაობელი ფიქრობა, რომელიც ადამიანის რაოდენობის ნახვა შესაძლებლობა, მაგრამ ძალიან ძალიან რთული მოდელებისთ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ მოდულის სწავლება (L2I) მოდულის შესახებ, რომელიც შეიძლება არაფერტალური მოდულების შესახებ NDR მოდულებში დავყენება. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ შეცდომარებული ფიქრობის ორი ნაწილში ფორმულებთ: 1) ინტერფექციის ინტერფექციის განსაკუთრება, და 2) შეცდომარებულია ფაქტიდან და წარმოდომარებით, რომელიც განსაზ TAT-QA-ს ბაზაზე, ჩვენ მნიშვნელოვანი HQA მონაცემები 8,283 ჰიპოტეტიკური კითხვებით შევქმნა. ჩვენ დავყენებთ პროგრამების L2I-ს TAGOP-ზე, TAT-QA-ზე, რომელიც ჩვენი პროგრამების პარაცინალურობა და ეფექტიურობის გადაწყენება.', 'hu': 'A neurális diszkrét érvelés (NDR) figyelemreméltó előrelépést mutatott a mély modellek és diszkrét érvelés kombinációjában. Azonban megállapítjuk, hogy a meglévő NDR-megoldás jelentős teljesítménycsökkenést szenved feltételezett kérdésekben, például "milyen lenne az éves megtérülés, ha 2020-ban a bevétel megduplázódna". A feltételezett kérdések megválaszolásának kulcsa az ellentétes gondolkodás, ami az emberi érvelés természetes képessége, de nehéz a mély modellek számára. Ebben a munkában kidolgozunk egy L2I (Learning to Imagine) modult, amely zökkenőmentesen beépíthető NDR modellekbe, hogy megvalósítsa a láthatatlan ellentények képzeletét. Különösen két lépésben fogalmazzuk meg az ellenténybeli gondolkodást: 1) a beavatkozásra szánt tény azonosítása, és 2) az ellentényből és feltételezésből eredő tényt, amelyek neurális hálózatként vannak kialakítva. A TAT-QA alapján egy nagyon kihívást jelentő HQA adatkészletet építünk 8 283 hipotetikus kérdéssel. A javasolt L2I-t alkalmazzuk a TAGOP-ra, a TAT-QA legkorszerűbb megoldására, amely igazolja megközelítésünk racionalitását és hatékonyságát.', 'el': 'Η νευρωνική διακριτή συλλογιστική (NDR) έχει δείξει αξιοσημείωτη πρόοδο στον συνδυασμό βαθέων μοντέλων με διακριτή συλλογιστική. Ωστόσο, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η υπάρχουσα λύση πάσχει από μεγάλη πτώση απόδοσης σε υποθετικά ερωτήματα, π.χ. "ποιο θα ήταν το ετήσιο ποσοστό απόδοσης εάν τα έσοδα του 2020 διπλασιαστούν". Το κλειδί για την απάντηση υποθετικών ερωτήσεων (HQA) είναι η αντίθετη σκέψη, η οποία είναι μια φυσική ικανότητα ανθρώπινης λογικής αλλά δύσκολη για βαθιά μοντέλα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, σχεδιάζουμε μια ενότητα εκμάθησης φαντασίας (η οποία μπορεί να ενσωματωθεί απρόσκοπτα σε μοντέλα για να εκτελέσει τη φαντασία του αόρατου αντιφατικού. Ειδικότερα, διατυπώνουμε την αντίθετη σκέψη σε δύο βήματα: 1) προσδιορίζοντας το γεγονός που πρέπει να παρέμβει, και 2) αντλώντας το αντίθετο από το γεγονός και την υπόθεση, τα οποία σχεδιάζονται ως νευρωνικά δίκτυα. Με βάση την ΤΤ-QA, κατασκευάζουμε ένα πολύ απαιτητικό σύνολο δεδομένων με 8,283 υποθετικές ερωτήσεις. Εφαρμόζουμε την προτεινόμενη L2I στο TAGOP, την υπερσύγχρονη λύση για την TAT-QA, επικυρώνοντας την ορθολογική και αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας.', 'it': 'Il ragionamento discreto neurale (NDR) ha mostrato notevoli progressi nella combinazione di modelli profondi con ragionamento discreto. Tuttavia, troviamo che la soluzione NDR esistente soffre di un forte calo delle prestazioni su domande ipotetiche, ad esempio "quale sarebbe il tasso di rendimento annualizzato se le entrate nel 2020 fossero raddoppiate". La chiave per la risposta ipotetica alle domande (HQA) è il pensiero controfattuale, che è una capacità naturale del ragionamento umano ma difficile per modelli profondi. In questo lavoro, elaboriamo un modulo Learning to Imagine (L2I), che può essere incorporato senza soluzione di continuità nei modelli NDR per eseguire l\'immaginazione di controfattuali invisibili. In particolare, formuliamo il pensiero controfattuale in due fasi: 1) identificando il fatto di intervenire, e 2) derivando il controfattuale dal fatto e dall\'assunto, che sono progettati come reti neurali. Basandoci su TAT-QA, costruiamo un dataset HQA molto impegnativo con 8.283 domande ipotetiche. Applichiamo il L2I proposto a TAGOP, la soluzione all\'avanguardia sul TAT-QA, convalidando la razionalità e l\'efficacia del nostro approccio.', 'lt': 'Neural discrete reasoning (NDR) has shown remarkable progress in combining deep models with discrete reasoning.  Tačiau mes konstatuojame, kad esamas NDR sprendimas patiria didelį hipotetinių klausimų, pvz. "koks būtų metinis grąžos lygis, jei 2020 m. pajamos būtų padvigubintos". Pagrindinis hipotetinio atsakymo į klausimus (angl. hypothetical question answer, HQA) klausimas yra priešingas faktas, kuris yra natūralus žmogaus pagrįstumo gebėjimas, bet sunkus giliems modeliams. In this work, we devise a Learning to Imagine (L2I) module, which can be seamlessly incorporated into NDR models to perform the imagination of unseen counterfactual.  Visų pirma mes formuojame priešingą mąstymą dviem etapais: 1) nustatome faktą įsikišti ir 2) nustatome priešingą faktą ir prielaidą, kurie yra sukurti kaip nerviniai tinklai. Remiantis TAT-QA, sukuriame labai sunkų HQA duomenų rinkinį su 8 283 hipotetiniais klausimais. Mes taikome siūlomą L2I TAGOP, naujausią TAT-QA sprendimą, patvirtindami mūsų požiūrio racionalumą ir veiksmingumą.', 'kk': 'Невралдық дискретті сезімдеу (NDR) дискретті сезімдеу үлгілерін жинақтау үшін белгілі жағдай көрсетілді. Бірақ, біз NDR шешімі гипотетикалық сұрақтардың үлкен әрекеттерінің шешімінен, мысалы: "2020 жылы қайтару жылдық жылдық мөлшері қайтару жылдығы қайтарылған болса, қандай болады?" деп ойлаймы Гипотетикалық сұрақтардың жауап беру (HQA) кілті - шындық ойлау, бұл адамдардың тәуелдеу мүмкіндігі, бірақ түсінікті үлгілер үшін қиын. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз келістіру (L2I) модулін құрамыз. Бұл NDR үлгілеріне сәйкес істеуге болады. Есінікте, біз жалғыз ойлауды екі қадам ретінде формуладық: 1) қатынау үшін шындығын анықтап, 2) невралдық желілер ретінде құрылған факт және таңдау үшін қарсы шындығын анықтап тұрмыз. TAT-QA негізінде, 8,283 гипотетикалық сұрақтар мен HQA деректер қорын құрамыз. Біз L2I-ді TAGOP-ге қолданып, TAT-QA-ның әртүрлі шешіміне қолданып, өзіміздің рационализациялық және эффективнігін тексеру.', 'mk': 'Неуралното дискретно размислување (НДР) покажа извонреден напредок во комбинацијата на длабоките модели со дискретно размислување. Сепак, сметаме дека постојаното решение на НДР страда од голем пад на резултатите на хипотетичките прашања, на пример „која би била годишната стапка на враќање ако приходите во 2020 година се двојат“. The key to hypothetical question answering (HQA) is counterfactual thinking, which is a natural ability of human reasoning but difficult for deep models.  Во оваа работа, ние дизајнираме модул „Научи да замисли“ (L2I), кој може да се вклопи непосредно во моделите на НДР за да ја изврши замислата на невидливите контрафакти. Посебно, го формулираме контрафактичното мислење во два чекори: 1) идентификувањето на фактот за интервенција, и 2) извлекувањето на контрафактичното мислење од фактот и претпоставката, кои се дизајнирани како нервни мрежи. Базирано на TAT-QA, изградуваме многу предизвикувачки податоци за HQA со 8.283 хипотетички прашања. We apply the proposed L2I to TAGOP, the state-of-the-art solution on TAT-QA, validating the rationality and effectiveness of our approach.', 'ms': "Rasalah diambil saraf (NDR) telah menunjukkan kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam menyatukan model dalam dengan rasalah diambil. Namun, kami dapati penyelesaian NDR yang wujud menderita dari turun prestasi yang besar pada soalan hipotetik, misalnya 'apa kadar kembalian tahun akan menjadi jika pendapatan pada tahun 2020 digandakan'. The key to hypothetical question answering (HQA) is counterfactual thinking, which is a natural ability of human reasoning but difficult for deep models.  Dalam kerja ini, kami merancang modul Learning to Imagine (L2I), yang boleh disertai secara terus-menerus ke dalam model NDR untuk melakukan imajinasi yang tidak kelihatan bertentangan fakta. Secara khususnya, kita membentuk pemikiran kontrafakta menjadi dua langkah: 1) mengenalpasti fakta untuk interven, dan 2) mendatangkan kontrafakta dari fakta dan asumsi, yang direka sebagai rangkaian saraf. Berdasarkan TAT-QA, kami membina set data HQA yang sangat menantang dengan 8,283 soalan hipotetik. Kami melaksanakan L2I yang diusulkan untuk TAGOP, penyelesaian terbaik pada TAT-QA, mengesahkan racionaliti dan efektiviti pendekatan kami.", 'ml': 'Neural discrete reasoning (NDR) has shown remarkable progress in combining deep models with discrete reasoning.  എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള NDR പരിഹാരം ഹൈപ്റ്ററിക്കല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കഷ്ടപ്പെടുന്നു ഹൈപ്പിറ്ററിക്കല്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന്റെ താക്കോല്\u200d (ഹെക്യൂഎ) എന്തെങ്കിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ചിന്തിക്കുന്നതാണ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ചിന്തിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഘടകം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ NDR മോഡലി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ചിന്തിക്കുന്നത് രണ്ട് പടികളിലേക്ക് രൂപപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: 1) നിരീക്ഷിക്കാനുള്ള സത്യത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതും, 2)  TAT-QA അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d, 8,283 ഹൈപ്റ്ററിക്കല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളുള്ള ഹെക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുകള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചു. നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രാദോഷ്ട്രിയപ്പെട്ട L2I ടാഗോപ്പിലേക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ടാട്ടി-ക്യൂഎയുടെ രാജ്യത്തെ ആര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ രീതിയിലേ', 'mn': 'НДР нь гүн гүнзгий загваруудыг хуваалцахад гайхалтай хөгжлийг харуулсан. Гэхдээ бид NDR шийдэл нь гипотетикийн асуултуудаас том үр дүнтэй болж байгааг олж мэднэ. Жишээлбэл 2020 оны орлогын хоёр дахин үр дүнтэй байвал жилийн орлогын хувь нь ямар байх вэ? Гипотетикийн асуултын хариултын түлхүүр нь буруу бодол юм. Энэ бол хүн төрөлхтний ойлголтын байгалийн чадвар, гэхдээ гүн загварын тулд хэцүү. Энэ ажлын тулд бид төсөөлөх суралцах (L2I) модуль төсөөлж байна. Энэ модуль NDR загвар руу шууд хадгалагдаж болох юм. Ялангуяа бид хоёр алхам руу зөрчилдөг бодлогыг тодорхойлж байна: 1) оролцохын тулд бодлогыг тодорхойлж, 2) мэдрэлийн сүлжээгээр зохион байгуулагдсан бодлого болон таамаглалтаас гаргаж байна. TAT-QA-ын үндсэн нь бид 8,283 гипотетик асуултуудтай маш шаардлагатай HQA өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж байна. Бид L2I-г TAGOP-д, TAT-QA-ын урлагийн шийдэл дээр ашиглаж, бидний арга баримтын үндэслэл болон үр дүнтэй байдлыг шалгаж байна.', 'mt': 'Ir-raġunament diskret newrali (NDR) wera progress notevoli fil-kombinazzjoni ta’ mudelli profondi ma’ raġunament diskret. Madankollu, isibu li s-soluzzjoni e żistenti tal-NDR tbati minn tnaqqis kbir fil-prestazzjoni fuq mistoqsijiet ipotetiċi, pereżempju "x\'tkun ir-rata annwali tar-redditu jekk id-dħul fl-2020 ikun irdoppjat". Iċ-ċavetta għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet ipotetiċi (HQA) hija l-ħsieb kontrofattwali, li hija kapaċità naturali tar-raġunament uman iżda diffiċli għal mudelli profondi. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nħejju modulu ta’ Tagħlim għall-Immaġina (L2I), li jista’ jiġi inkorporat mingħajr xkiel fil-mudelli NDR biex titwettaq l-immaġinazzjoni ta’ kontrofattwali mhux osservata. B’mod partikolari, nagħmlu ħsieb kontrofattwali f’żewġ passi: 1) l-identifikazzjoni tal-fatt li jintervjeni, u 2) id-derivazzjoni tal-kontrofattwali mill-fatt u s-suppożizzjoni, li huma mfassla bħala netwerks newrali. Abbażi tat-TAT-QA, a ħna nibnu sett ta’ dejta tal-HQA diffiċli ħafna b’8,283 mistoqsija ipotetika. Aħna napplikaw il-L2I proposta għat-TAGOP, is-soluzzjoni l-aktar avvanzata dwar it-TAT-QA, li tivvalida r-razzjonalità u l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna.', 'no': 'Nøyraldiskrete rasjon (NDR) har vist merkelig framgang i kombinasjonen av dype modeller med diskrete rasjon. Men vi finn at det eksisterande NDR-løysinga køyrer frå stor utgangspunkt på hypotetiske spørsmål, f.eks. «kva årlige returneringsrate ville vera dersom inntekene i 2020 er dobbelt». Nøkkelen til hipotetisk spørsmål som svarar (HQA) er vilkårleg tenking, som er ein naturleg kapasitet for menneske rasjon, men vanskeleg for dype modeller. I denne arbeiden bestemmer vi ein læring for å forestille bilete (L2I) modul, som kan vera såkalt inkludert i NDR-modeller for å utføra imaginasjonen av ugjennomsiktige vilkfeil. I særskilt formerer vi counterfactual tenking inn i to steg: 1) identifiserer faktum for intervensjon, og 2) utfører det counterfactual frå faktum og assumpsjonen, som er designert som neuralnettverk. Basert på TAT-QA, konstruerer vi ein veldig vanskeleg HQA-dataset med 8,283 hypotetiske spørsmål. Vi bruker den foreslåde L2I til TAGOP, den kunstløysinga på TAT-QA, som validerer rationaliteten og effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt.', 'pl': 'Neural Discrete Rozumowanie (NDR) wykazało znaczący postęp w łączeniu głębokich modeli z dyskretnym rozumowaniem. Stwierdzamy jednak, że istniejące rozwiązanie NDR cierpi na duży spadek wydajności w kwestiach hipotetycznych, np. "jaka byłaby roczna stopa zwrotu, gdyby przychody w latach 2020 zostały podwojone". Kluczem do hipotetycznego odpowiedzi na pytania (HQA) jest myślenie kontrafaktualne, które jest naturalną zdolnością ludzkiego rozumowania, ale trudne dla głębokich modeli. W niniejszej pracy opracowujemy moduł Learning to Imagine (L2I), który może być bezproblemowo włączony do modeli NDR w celu realizacji wyobraźni niewidzialnego kontrafaktualnego. W szczególności formułujemy myślenie przeciwfaktyczne na dwa etapy: 1) identyfikację faktu do interwencji oraz 2) wywodzenie tego przeciwfaktycznego z faktu i założenia, które są zaprojektowane jako sieci neuronowe. W oparciu o TAT-QA konstruujemy bardzo wymagający zestaw danych HQA z 8,283 pytaniami hipotetycznymi. Proponowany L2I stosujemy do TAGOP, najnowocześniejszego rozwiązania dotyczącego TAT-QA, potwierdzającego racjonalność i skuteczność naszego podejścia.', 'ro': 'Raționamentul discret neural (NDR) a arătat progrese remarcabile în combinarea modelelor profunde cu raționamentul discret. Cu toate acestea, constatăm că soluția NDR existentă suferă de o scădere semnificativă a performanței în cazul întrebărilor ipotetice, de exemplu, "care ar fi rata anualizată a rentabilității dacă veniturile în 2020 ar fi dublate". Cheia răspunsului ipotetic la întrebări (HQA) este gândirea contrafactuală, care este o abilitate naturală a raționamentului uman, dar dificilă pentru modele profunde. În această lucrare, concepem un modul Learning to Imagine (L2I), care poate fi integrat fără probleme în modelele NDR pentru a realiza imaginația contrafactuală nevăzută. În special, formulăm gândirea contrafactuală în două etape: 1) identificarea faptului de intervenție și 2) derivată din fapt și presupunere, care sunt concepute ca rețele neurale. Bazat pe TAT-QA, construim un set de date HQA foarte provocator cu 8.283 întrebări ipotetice. Aplicăm L2I propus la TAGOP, soluția de ultimă oră pentru TAT-QA, validând raționalitatea și eficiența abordării noastre.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරාලික විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය (NDR) පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානය පෙන්වන්නේ ගොඩක් මොඩේල් එක්කන් විශේ ඒත් අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට NDR විස්තරය ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, උදාහරණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණය (HQA) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ (HQA) යතුර තමයි වැරදි හිතන්න, මිනිස් මේ වැඩේ අපි හිතාගන්න ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය (L2I) මෝඩියුල් එකක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්, ඒක NDR මොඩියුල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන විශේෂයෙන්, අපි වැරදි හිතන්නේ පැත්තක් දෙකට: 1) ඇත්තක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන්, 2) අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් පිළි TAT-QA අධාරණයෙන්, අපි ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හදන්නේ HQA දත්ත සැට 8,283 විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය L2I එක TAGOP වලට, TAT-QA වලින් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අවස්ථාවක් වි', 'sr': "Neuralno diskretno razmišljanje (NDR) pokazalo je izuzetan napredak u kombinaciji dubokih modela sa diskretnim razumijevanjem. Međutim, mi smatramo da postojeće rješenje NDR pati od velikog pad izvršnosti na hipotetička pitanja, na primer. 'Koja bi godišnja stopa povratka bila ako bi prihod 2020. bio udvostručen'. Ključ odgovora na hipotetičko pitanje (HQA) je nepravedno razmišljanje, što je prirodna sposobnost ljudskog razuma ali teško za duboke modele. U ovom poslu, razmišljamo o učenju zamišljanja modula (L2I), koji može biti bezvezno uključen u NDR modele kako bi izvršili maštu nevidljivih krivotvornih faktora. Posebno, formuliramo krivotvorno razmišljanje na dva koraka: 1) identificiranje činjenice da se intervjuiše, i 2) proizvedenje krivotvornog faktora iz činjenice i pretpostavke, koje su dizajnirane kao neuralne mreže. Na temelju TAT-QA, izgradili smo veoma izazovnu setu podataka HQA sa 8.283 hipotetičkih pitanja. Prikazujemo predloženo L2I na TAGOP, državno umjetno rešenje na TAT-QA, potvrđujući racionalnost i efikasnost našeg pristupa.", 'so': "Sababta caqliga ah ee caqliga diidmada ah (NDR) wuxuu muujiyey horumar aad u fiican oo ku darsameynta tusaalooyinka mool dheer, sababo kala duwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaynu aragnaa in xafiiska NDR ay jiraan ay ka xanuunsadaan su'aalaha guud e e fikradda, tusaale ahaan waxa ay noqon lahayd in dakhliga 2020 labanlaab laga helay. Qofka ugu fura jawaabta su'aalaha fikirka (HQA) waa fikrada rasmiga ah, taasina waa awoodda dabiicadda ee sababta biniaadamka laakiin waa u adag qaababka mool dheer. Markaas waxan, waxaynu sameynaa qalabka wax lagu barto si aan u fekero (L2I), taas oo si xadar ah looga dhex gelin karo modelalka NDR si aan u sameynno fikrada jaaha ah. Si gaar ah, waxaynu u sameynaa fikrada rasmiga ah labo tallaabo: 1) inaannu aqoonsanno xaqiiqda si ay u dhexayso, iyo 2) oo ka soo bixino xaqiiqa iyo malaha, taasoo loo qoray shabakado neuro ah. Inta lagu saleeyo TAT-QA, waxaynu dhisaynaa sawir aad u adag HQA oo ay ku haystaan su'aalo fikrad ah 8,283. Waxaynu u dalbannaa TAGOP, xaaladda farshaxanta ee TAT-QA, si aan u xaqiijinno aqoonta iyo faa'iidada dhaqdhaqaalahayaga.", 'sv': 'Neural discrete resonement (NDR) har visat anmärkningsvärda framsteg när det gäller att kombinera djupa modeller med diskret resonemang. Vi konstaterar dock att befintlig NDR-lösning lider av stora resultatfall på hypotetiska frågor, t.ex. "vad den årliga avkastningen skulle vara om intäkterna år 2020 fördubblades". Nyckeln till hypotetiskt frågesvar (HQA) är kontrafaktiskt tänkande, vilket är en naturlig förmåga för mänskligt resonemang men svårt för djupa modeller. I detta arbete utformar vi en L2I-modul (Learning to Imagine), som sömlöst kan integreras i NDR-modeller för att utföra fantasin av osynlig kontrafaktisk. Framför allt formulerar vi kontrafaktiskt tänkande i två steg: 1) identifiera det faktum att ingripa, och 2) härleda det kontrafaktiska från fakta och antagande, som är utformade som neurala nätverk. Baserat på TAT-QA konstruerar vi ett mycket utmanande HQA-dataset med 8 283 hypotetiska frågor. Vi tillämpar den föreslagna L2I på TAGOP, den senaste lösningen på TAT-QA, vilket bekräftar rationaliteten och effektiviteten i vårt tillvägagångssätt.', 'ta': "நெருக்கமான வித்தியாசமான காரணங்கள் (NDR) ஆழம் மாதிரிகளை வித்தியாசமான காரணத்துடன் இணைப்பதில் முன்னேற்றம் காட் எனினும், நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் இருக்கும் NDR தீர்வு இருக்கும் பெரிய செயல்திருக்கும் கேள்விகளிலிருந்து குறைக்கும் போது, அதாவது '2020- தெளிவான கேள்விக்கு பதில் (HQA) என்பது எதிர்மறையான சிந்தனையாகும், அது மனித காரணங்களின் இயல்பான ஆற்றல், ஆனால் ஆழமான மாதிரி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் கற்பனை செய்ய கற்றுக் கூற்றை உருவாக்குகிறோம். இது முழுமையாக NDR மாதிரிகளில் சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, மறைவு எதிர்மறை கற்பனையை ச In particular, we formulate counterfactual thinking into two steps: 1) identifying the fact to intervene, and 2) deriving the counterfactual from the fact and assumption, which are designed as neural networks.  TAT-QA அடிப்படையில், நாம் மிகவும் சவாலிக்கும் HQA தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம் 8,283 hypothetical கேள்விகள். நாங்கள் TAT-QA-ன் நிலையில் தீர்வு தீர்வு TAGOP-க்கு முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட L2I ஐ பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் விக", 'ur': 'نیورال الٹ الٹ الٹ الٹ الٹ (NDR) نے عمیق موڈل کو الٹ الٹ الٹ الٹ کے ساتھ جمع کرنے میں بہت اچھا پیشرفت دکھایا ہے۔ لیکن ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ موجود NDR حل بہت بڑی عملکرد کے ذریعے اچھے سوالوں پر ڈوب رہی ہے، جیسے کہ "سال کی بازگشت کا رخصت کیا ہوگا اگر 2020 میں درآمد دوگنا ہوتا" اپنا سوال جواب (HQA) کا کلیدہ مخالف فکرت ہے، جو انسان کے منطق کا طبیعی قابلیت ہے لیکن عمیق موڈل کے لئے مشکل ہے. اس کام میں، ہم نے تصور کرنے کے لئے ایک سیکھنا (L2I) موڈل بنایا ہے، جو NDR موڈل میں سیدھی طرح شامل ہو سکتا ہے کہ غیر دیکھے فارفیل کی تصور کرے۔ مخصوصا، ہم نے دفعہ فکری کو دو سطح میں فرمول کیا ہے: 1) سطح کے مطابق معلوم کرنا، اور 2) سطح اور گمان کے مطابق غلط فکری سے، جو نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کے طور پر طراحی کی گئی ہیں۔ TAT-QA پر بنیاد ہے، ہم نے 8,283 فرضی سوال کے ساتھ ایک بہت مشکل HQA ڈاٹسٹ بنایا ہے. ہم TAGOP کے لئے پیشنهاد L2I کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، TAT-QA کے قابل تحقیق، ہمارے تقریبا کی منطقیت اور فعالیت کی تصدیق کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': 'Name Lekin, biz bilganimiz, mavjud NDR yo\'lchami hypotetikal savollaridan katta ishlatish imkoniyatini ko\'rsatadi, masalan, "2020 yillarda yetarli narsalar ikki marta bo\'lgan bo\'lsa" deb o\'ylaymiz. Hypotetika savol javob berish (HQA) kaliti, bu odamning asl sabablari, lekin eng yuqori modellar uchun juda qiyin. Bu ishda, biz tasavvur qilish modulini o\'rganamiz. Bu narsalar NDR modellariga o\'rtacha o\'rganishni ko\'rsatish mumkin. Ko\'rinishimiz, biz ikki qadamga o\'ylab o\'ylashni tasavvur qilamiz: 1) intervention uchun haqiqatni aniqlash va 2 bilan boshqarish haqiqidagi narsa va g\'oyalarning tashkilotlarini nazar tarmoq sifatida yaratish mumkin. TAT-QA asosida, biz 8,283 hypothetikal savollar bilan juda qiziqarli HQA maʼlumot satrini yaratimiz. Biz talab qilingan L2I TAGOP, TAT-QA davlatning holati holatiga qoʻllayapmiz, bu usulning haqiqiqiyligini va effektligini bajaramiz.', 'vi': 'Về lập trình bí mật thần kinh (NDR) đã cho thấy một tiến bộ đáng chú ý khi kết hợp các mô hình sâu với lập trình riêng. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi thấy rằng giải pháp NDR hiện tại phải chịu hậu quả giảm lớn trong các câu hỏi giả sử, ví dụ "số lãi suất tổng hợp sẽ là g ì nếu thu nhập ở 2020 bị gấp đôi". Chìa khóa để trả lời câu hỏi giả định (HQA) là suy nghĩ ngược về sự kiện, đó là khả năng tự nhiên của việc lý lẽ con người nhưng khó cho các mô hình sâu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghĩ ra một mô- đun "Learning to imagination (L2I) có thể nhập hoàn hảo vào mô hình dáng NDR để thực hiện trí tưởng tượng của một vật tương đối vô hình. Ví dụ, chúng ta đặt suy nghĩ ngược về hai bước: 1) xác định sự thật để can thiệp, và 2) từ sự thật và giả định tương đối, được thiết kế như là mạng thần kinh. Dựa trên TAT-QA, chúng tôi xây dựng một tập tin HQA đầy thử thách với các câu hỏi giả định 8,23. Chúng tôi áp dụng L2I với TAGOP, giải pháp hiện đại trên TAT-QA, xác nhận hợp lý và hiệu quả của phương pháp này.', 'nl': "Neural discrete redenering (NDR) heeft opmerkelijke vooruitgang laten zien in het combineren van diepe modellen met discrete redenering. We merken echter dat bestaande NDR-oplossing lijdt aan een grote prestatiedaling op hypothetische vragen, bijvoorbeeld 'wat het jaarlijkse rendement zou zijn als de omzet in 2020 verdubbeld zou worden'. De sleutel tot hypothetisch antwoord op vragen (HQA) is contrapactisch denken, wat een natuurlijk vermogen van menselijk redeneren is, maar moeilijk voor diepe modellen. In dit werk ontwikkelen we een Learning to Imagine (L2I) module, die naadloos kan worden geïntegreerd in NDR modellen om de verbeelding van onzichtbaar contrafactisch uit te voeren. In het bijzonder formuleren we contrafactisch denken in twee stappen: 1) het identificeren van het feit om in te grijpen, en 2) het afleiden van het contrafactische uit het feit en de veronderstelling, die zijn ontworpen als neurale netwerken. Op basis van TAT-QA bouwen we een zeer uitdagende HQA dataset met 8,283 hypothetische vragen. We passen de voorgestelde L2I toe op TAGOP, de state-of-the-art oplossing voor TAT-QA, en valideren de rationaliteit en effectiviteit van onze aanpak.", 'hr': 'Neuralno diskretno razumijevanje (NDR) pokazalo je izuzetan napredak u kombinaciji dubokih modela s diskretnim razumijevanjem. Međutim, smatramo da postojeće rješenje NDR-a pati od velikog smanjenja učinka na hipotetička pitanja, na primjer: "Koja bi godišnja stopa povratka bila ako bi prihod 2020. bio udvostručen". Ključ odgovora na hipotetičko pitanje (HQA) je nepravedno razmišljanje, što je prirodna sposobnost ljudskog razumijevanja ali teško za duboke modele. U ovom poslu, razmišljamo o modulu učenja zamišljanja (L2I), koji može biti beznačajno uključen u NDR modele kako bi izvršili maštu nevidljivih krivotvornih faktora. Posebno, formuliramo krivotvorno razmišljanje na dva koraka: 1) identificiranje činjenice interveniranja i 2) proizvođenje krivotvornog faktora iz činjenice i pretpostavke, koje su dizajnirane kao neuralne mreže. Na temelju TAT-QA, izgradili smo veoma izazovnu kompletu podataka HQA sa 8.283 hipotetičkih pitanja. Primjenjujemo predloženo L2I na TAGOP, državno umjetno rješenje na TAT-QA, potvrđujući racionalnost i učinkovitost našeg pristupa.', 'da': 'Neural diskret ræsonnement (NDR) har vist bemærkelsesværdige fremskridt i at kombinere dybe modeller med diskret ræsonnement. Vi konstaterer imidlertid, at eksisterende NDR-løsning lider under et stort performance fald på hypotetiske spørgsmål, f.eks. "hvad den årlige afkast ville være, hvis omsætningen i 2020 blev fordoblet". Nøglen til hypotetisk spørgsmålsbesvarelse (HQA) er kontrafaktisk tænkning, som er en naturlig evne til menneskelig ræsonnement, men vanskelig for dybe modeller. I dette arbejde udvikler vi et Læring til at forestille sig (L2I) modul, som problemfrit kan indarbejdes i NDR modeller for at udføre fantasien af uset kontrafaktisk. Især formulerer vi kontrafaktuel tænkning i to trin: 1) identificering af den kendsgerning, der skal gribe ind, og 2) udledelse af kontrafaktuel fra kendsgerningen og antagelsen, som er designet som neurale netværk. Baseret på TAT-QA konstruerer vi et meget udfordrende HQA datasæt med 8.283 hypotetiske spørgsmål. Vi anvender den foreslåede L2I til TAGOP, den avancerede løsning på TAT-QA, som validerer rationaliteten og effektiviteten af vores tilgang.', 'bg': 'Неврологичното дискретно разсъждение (НДР) показва забележителен напредък в съчетаването на дълбоки модели с дискретно разсъждение. Установяваме обаче, че съществуващото решение за НДР страда от голям спад на ефективността по хипотетични въпроси, например "каква би била годишният процент на възвръщаемост, ако приходите през 2020 г. бъдат удвоени". Ключът към хипотетичното отговаряне на въпроси е контрафактическото мислене, което е естествена способност на човешкото разсъждаване, но трудно за дълбоките модели. В тази работа разработваме модул Учене да си представим (който може безпроблемно да бъде вграден в модели за изпълнение на въображението на невидими контрафакти. По-конкретно формулираме контрафактическото мислене в две стъпки: 1) идентифициране на факта, който трябва да се намеси, и 2) извличане на контрафактическото от факта и предположението, които са проектирани като невронни мрежи. Въз основа на TAT-QA, ние конструираме много предизвикателен набор от данни от HQA с 8 283 хипотетични въпроса. Ние прилагаме предложеното към ТАГОП, най-съвременното решение за ТАТ-КВА, утвърждавайки рационалността и ефективността на нашия подход.', 'ko': '신경 이산 추리(NDR)는 깊이 모델과 이산 추리를 결합시키는 데 현저한 진전을 거두었다.그러나 기존 NDR 솔루션은 "2020년 매출이 두 배로 늘어나면 연간 수익률이 얼마나 나올까"와 같은 가정적 문제에 있어 성능 저하가 큰 것으로 나타났습니다.가정적 질문응답(HQA)의 관건은 반사실적 사고인데 이는 인류 추리의 자연적인 능력이지만 심층 모델로서는 어렵다.이 작업에서 우리는 보이지 않는 반사실에 대한 상상을 수행하기 위해 NDR 모델에 틈새 없이 통합되는 학습상상(L2I) 모듈을 설계했다.특히 우리는 반사실적 사고를 두 가지 절차로 표현한다. 1) 관여할 사실을 식별하고 2) 사실과 가설에서 반사실을 유도하며 이 두 가지 사실과 가설은 신경 네트워크로 설계된다.TAT-QA를 바탕으로 우리는 매우 도전적인 HQA 데이터 집합을 구축했고 8283개의 가설 문제를 포함했다.우리가 건의한 L2I를 TAGOP에 응용할 것이다. 이것은 TAT-QA에 관한 가장 선진적인 해결 방안으로 우리의 방법의 합리성과 유효성을 검증했다.', 'de': 'Neurales diskretes Denken (NDR) hat bemerkenswerte Fortschritte bei der Kombination tiefer Modelle mit diskretem Denken gezeigt. Wir stellen jedoch fest, dass die bestehende NDR-Lösung bei hypothetischen Fragen unter einem starken Leistungsabfall leidet, z.B. "wie hoch wäre die jährliche Rendite, wenn sich der Umsatz in 2020 verdoppelt hätte". Der Schlüssel zur hypothetischen Beantwortung von Fragen (HQA) ist kontrafaktisches Denken, das eine natürliche Fähigkeit des menschlichen Denkens ist, aber für tiefe Modelle schwierig. In dieser Arbeit entwickeln wir ein Learning to Imagine (L2I)-Modul, das nahtlos in NDR-Modelle integriert werden kann, um die Vorstellungskraft des unsichtbaren Kontrafaktischen zu erfüllen. Insbesondere formulieren wir kontrafaktisches Denken in zwei Schritten: 1) Identifizierung der zu intervenierenden Tatsache und 2) Ableitung des kontrafaktischen aus der Tatsache und Annahme, die als neuronale Netze konzipiert sind. Basierend auf TAT-QA konstruieren wir einen sehr anspruchsvollen HQA Datensatz mit 8,283 hypothetischen Fragen. Wir wenden die vorgeschlagene L2I auf TAGOP an, die State-of-the-Art Lösung für TAT-QA, und bestätigen die Rationalität und Effektivität unseres Ansatzes.', 'id': 'Pemikiran rahasia saraf (NDR) telah menunjukkan kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam menggabungkan model dalam dengan pemikiran rahasia. Namun, kami menemukan bahwa solusi NDR yang ada menderita dari turun prestasi besar pada pertanyaan hipotetis, misalnya "apa kadar kembalian anualisasi akan jika pendapatan pada tahun 2020 dua kali lipat". Kunci untuk menjawab pertanyaan hipotetis (HQA) adalah pemikiran kontrofaksi, yang merupakan kemampuan alami bagi pemikiran manusia tetapi sulit untuk model dalam. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami merancang modul Learning to Imagine (L2I), yang dapat disertai secara terus-menerus dalam model NDR untuk melakukan imajinasi dari kontrafaktal yang tidak terlihat. Terutama, kita membentuk pemikiran kontrofaksi menjadi dua langkah: 1) mengidentifikasi fakta untuk intervensi, dan 2) mendatangkan kontrofaksi dari fakta dan asumsi, yang dirancang sebagai jaringan saraf. Berdasarkan TAT-QA, kami membangun dataset HQA yang sangat menantang dengan 8.283 pertanyaan hipotetis. Kami menerapkan L2I yang diusulkan untuk TAGOP, solusi terbaik pada TAT-QA, mengevalifikasi racionalitas dan efektivitas pendekatan kita.', 'fa': 'دلیل\u200cهای مختلف عصبی (NDR) در ترکیب مدل\u200cهای عمیق با دلیل\u200cهای مختلف، پیشرفت فوق\u200cالعاده را نشان داده است. با این وجود، ما فهمیدیم که راه حل NDR موجود از کاهش عملکرد بزرگ روی سوالات فرضیه\u200cای درد می\u200cیابد، مثلاً اگر درآمد در سال ۲۰۰۲ دو برابر شود، چقدر میزان بازگشت سال می\u200cشود. کلید جواب سوال فرضیه\u200cای (HQA) فکری حقیقی است که توانایی طبیعی از منطقی انسان است ولی برای مدل عمیق سخت است. در این کار، ما یک یادگیری برای تصور کردن moduل (L2I) را طراحی می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند به طور بی\u200cنظیر در مدل NDR شامل شود تا تصور کردن تصور بی\u200cنظیر را انجام دهد. در خصوص، ما فکرهای دروغگویی را در دو مرحله فرمول می کنیم: ۱) مشخص کردن حقیقت برای داخل شدن، و ۲) متوجه شدن دروغگویی از حقیقت و فرضیه، که به عنوان شبکه های عصبی طراحی می شوند. بر اساس TAT-QA، ما یک مجموعه داده های HQA بسیار سخت ساختیم با 8.283 سوال hypothetical. ما پیشنهاد L2I را به TAGOP، راه حل هنری در TAT-QA، تأثیر منطقی و فعالیت دستور ما می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': "Maelezo yasiyo ya kawaida (NDR) yameonyesha maendeleo mazuri katika kuunganisha mifano ya kina yenye sababu tofauti. Hata hivyo, tunagundua kuwa suluhisho la NDR lililopo linakabiliwa na kuanguka kwa ufanisi mkubwa kwenye maswali ya kidini, kwa mfano ‘kiwango cha kurudi kwa mwaka utakuwa kama mapato ya mwaka 2020 yatazidishiwa mardufu'.” Kifungu cha swali la kijinga (HQA) ni kufikiri tofauti, ambacho ni uwezo wa asili wa sababu za binadamu lakini ni ngumu kwa mifano ya ndani. Katika kazi hii, tunaunda mfumo wa kujifunza kufikiri (L2I), ambao unaweza kuingizwa kwa mara nyingi katika mifano ya NDR ili kutekeleza fikra za usio na haki. Kwa hakika, tunatengeneza kufikiri kwa hatua mbili: 1) kutambua ukweli wa kuingilia kati, na 2) kuonyesha ukweli na dhana, ambazo zinatengenezwa kama mitandao ya neura. Kutokana na TAT-QA, tunajenga seti ya taarifa za HQA yenye maswali ya kidini 8,283. We apply the proposed L2I to TAGOP, the state-of-the-art solution on TAT-QA, validating the rationality and effectiveness of our approach.", 'af': 'Neurale diskrete redering (NDR) het betekende vordering vertoon in die kombinasie van diepe modele met diskrete redering. Maar ons vind dat bestaande NDR-oplossing lyk van groot prestasie afval op hipotetike vrae, bv. "Wat sal die jaarlike tempo van terugkeer wees as die inkomste in 2020 dubbel geword het?" Die sleutel na hipotetike vraag antwoord (HQA) is teenwerklike gedink, wat is \'n natuurlike moontlik van menslike redening, maar moeilik vir diep modele. In hierdie werk, het ons \'n Leer om te verwerk (L2I) module ontwerp, wat kan selfs inkorporeer word in NDR-modelles om die verwerking van onbesigtige counterfactual te doen. In spesifieke formeer ons teen feilike dink binne twee stappe: 1) identifiseer die feit om te intervene, en 2) afgelei die teen feit en aanvaardigheid van die feit en aanvaardigheid, wat as neurale netwerke ontwerp word. Op TAT-QA gebaseer ons \'n baie challende HQA datastel met 8,283 hypotetiese vrae. Ons wend die voorgestelde L2I aan TAGOP, die staat-van-kunstens oplossing op TAT-QA, die rationaliteit en effektiviteit van ons toegang.', 'tr': "N철ral diskretli razylyk 횦철ne bolan NDR 챌철z체mi hypotetik soraglary흫 첵체ze d체힊체rip 첵ok bolmagyny d체힊체n첵채ris, myselm. '2020-nji 첵ylda gelin iki gezek bolsa, ja첵y흫 첵igrimi n채hili bolar?' hypotetik soragy흫 jogap bermegini흫 a 챌ary (HQA) 첵al흫y힊 pikirlenmesidir. Bu adamy흫 razylygyny흫 tebigat ukypdyr 첵철ne derin nusgalar 체챌in kyn. Bu i힊de, biz 철wrenmek 체챌in (L2I) mod체li pikir etmek 체챌in bir 철wrenmek 체챌in d체zenleyiriz. Bu mod체li NDR modellerine hi챌 hili da힊ary d철redip bilmedik 체챌in bir 힊ekilde 챌ykyp biler. 횜zellikde, biz sahypalary 2 ad캇m i챌ine d체힊체nmek 체챌in sahypalary 챌ykar첵arys: 1) intervaly 챌ykmak 체챌in, we 2) sahypalary neural 힊ebekeler h철km체nde tasarlan첵arlar. TAT-QA bu첵rukynda, 8,283 hipotetik soraglary bilen 철r채n 챌철pl체 bir HQA sahypasyny 챌ykar첵arys Biz TAGOP'a L2I teklip etdik, TAT-QA-ny흫 sungat챌ylyk 챌철z체mi, nusgamyzy흫 dogrylygyny we efektlygyny barla첵arys.", 'sq': 'Argumentimi nervor diskret (NDR) ka treguar përparim të shquar në kombinimin e modeleve të thella me arsyetimin diskret. Megjithatë, gjejmë se zgjidhja ekzistuese e NDR vuan nga rënia e madhe e performancës në pyetje hipotetike, për shembull, "cila do të ishte norma vjetore e kthimit në qoftë se të ardhurat në 2020 do të dyfishoheshin". The key to hypothetical question answering (HQA) is counterfactual thinking, which is a natural ability of human reasoning but difficult for deep models.  Në këtë punë, ne krijojmë një modul Mësimi për të Imagjinuar (L2I), i cili mund të përfshihet në mënyrë të papërshtatshme në modelet NDR për të kryer imagjinatën e kontrafakteve të padukshme. Në veçanti, ne formojmë mendimin kundërfaktor në dy hapa: 1) identifikimin e faktit për të ndërhyrë dhe 2) nxjerrjen e kundërfaktit nga fakti dhe supozimi, që janë dizajnuar si rrjete nervore. Based on TAT-QA, we construct a very challenging HQA dataset with 8,283 hypothetical questions.  Ne aplikojmë L2I të propozuar në TAGOP, zgjidhjen më të lartë në TAT-QA, duke validuar racionalitetin dhe efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë.', 'am': 'የጠለቅ ጥሩ ምክንያት (NDR) ጥልቅ ምሳሌዎችን በመቀላቀል በተለያየ ምክንያት የሚያሳየው ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ የNDR መፍትሄ ከታላቅ የአፍሪካዊ ጥያቄ የጦማሪነት ጥያቄ መከራ እንዲቀበል እናገኛለን፡፡ የhypothetical ጥያቄ መልስ (HQA) መክፈቻ አካላዊ አሳብ ነው፤ ይህ የሰው አካባቢ አካባቢ ነገር ግን ለጥልቅ ዓይነቶች ችግር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የሩቅ የውይይት ሐሳብ ለመፍጠር (L2I) ሚዲሎችን እናስተማርን እናደርጋለን፡፡ In particular, we formulate counterfactual thinking into two steps: 1) identifying the fact to intervene, and 2) deriving the counterfactual from the fact and assumption, which are designed as neural networks.  TAT-QA በመሠረት ላይ፣ 8,283 ተሟላዊ ጥያቄዎች ያሉትን የHQA ዳታሌሽን መሠረት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው L2I፣ TAT-QA የሀገሪቱን ትዕዛዝ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Nöral diskretli razılaşma (NDR) dərin modelləri diskretli razılaşma ilə birləşdirməkdə möhkəm tədbir göstərdi. Ancaq, həmin NDR çətinlikləri hipotetik sualların böyük performans düşüşündən keçirildiyini g örürük, bəlkə, 2020-də gəlirlər ikiqat artırsaydı. Hipotetik sualın cavab verməsi (HQA) haqsız fikirləşməsidir. Bu insan fikirləşməsi təbiətli qabiliyyətidir, lakin derin modellər üçün çətin. Bu işdə, düşünmək üçün öyrənmək (L2I) modulu təşkil edirik, ki, görmədiyimiz falsifiklərin hayal gücünü yerinə yetirmək üçün NDR modellərə imkansız olar. Özellikle, biz iftiralı fikirləri iki adım içində formüləyirik: 1) intervalanı tanıyır, 2) fərqli fikirləri neural ağları olaraq təşkil edilir. TAT-QA sayəsində, biz 8,283 hipotetik sualları ilə çox çətin HQA verilən bir quruluş inşa edirik. Biz təbliğ etdiyimiz L2I TAGOP, TAT-QA-nin sanat çətinliklərini təsdiqləyirik, bizim tərəfimizin razıllığını və etkinliğini təsdiqləyirik.', 'bs': 'Neuralno diskretno razumijevanje (NDR) pokazalo je izuzetan napredak u kombinaciji dubokih modela sa diskretnim razumijevanjem. Međutim, smatramo da postojeće rješenje NDR-a pati od velikog smanjenja učinka na hipotetička pitanja, na primjer: "Koja bi godišnja stopa povratka bila ako bi prihod 2020. bio udvostručen". Ključ odgovora na hipotetičko pitanje (HQA) je nepravedno razmišljanje, što je prirodna sposobnost ljudskog razuma ali teško za duboke modele. U ovom poslu, zamišljamo modul učenja za zamišljanje (L2I), koji može biti bezvezno uključen u NDR modele kako bi izvršili maštu nevidljivih krivotvornih faktora. Posebno, formuliramo krivotvorno razmišljanje na dva koraka: 1) identificiranje činjenice da se intervjuiše, i 2) izvlačenje krivotvornog faktora iz činjenice i pretpostavke, koje su dizajnirane kao neuralne mreže. Na temelju TAT-QA, izgradili smo veoma izazovnu setu podataka HQA sa 8.283 hipotetičkih pitanja. Mi primjenjujemo predloženo L2I na TAGOP, državno umjetno rješenje na TAT-QA, potvrđujući racionalnost i učinkovitost našeg pristupa.', 'ca': 'El raonament discret neuronal (NDR) ha demostrat un progrés notable en combinar models profunds amb raonament discret. Tot i així, descobrim que la solució NDR existent pateix una gran reducció de rendiment en preguntes hipotètiques, per exemple "quina seria la tasa anualizada de rendiment si els ingressos al 2020 es duplicassin". La clau per respondre a preguntes hipotètiques (HQA) és el pensament contrafet, que és una habilitat natural de raonament humà però difícil per a models profunds. In this work, we devise a Learning to Imagine (L2I) module, which can be seamlessly incorporated into NDR models to perform the imagination of unseen counterfactual.  En particular, formulem el pensament contrafet en dos passos: 1) identificant el fet d\'intervenir, i 2) derivant el contrafet del fet i l\'assumpció, dissenyats com a xarxes neurals. Basats en TAT-QA, construïm un conjunt de dades HQA molt difícil amb 8.283 preguntes hipotètiques. Aplicam el L2I proposat a TAGOP, la solució més avançada en TAT-QA, validant la racionalitat i l\'eficacia del nostre enfocament.', 'cs': 'Neurální diskrétní uvažování (NDR) prokázalo pozoruhodný pokrok v kombinaci hlubokých modelů s diskrétním uvažováním. Zjišťujeme však, že stávající řešení NDR trpí velkým poklesem výkonnosti v hypotetických otázkách, např. "jaká by byla roční míra návratnosti, kdyby se příjmy ve 2020 zdvojnásobily". Klíčem k hypotetickému odpovědi na otázky (HQA) je kontrafactické myšlení, což je přirozená schopnost lidského uvažování, ale pro hluboké modely obtížné. V této práci navrhujeme modul Learning to Imagine (L2I), který může být bezproblémově začleněn do NDR modelů, aby prováděl představivost neviditelného kontrafaktuálního. Konkrétně formulujeme kontrafaktuální myšlení do dvou kroků: 1) identifikace skutečnosti k intervenci a 2) odvození kontrafaktuálního z faktu a předpokladu, které jsou navrženy jako neuronové sítě. Na základě TAT-QA konstruujeme velmi náročný HQA datový soubor s 8,283 hypotetickými otázkami. Navrhovaný L2I aplikujeme na TAGOP, nejmodernější řešení TAT-QA, což ověřuje racionalitu a efektivitu našeho přístupu.', 'hy': 'Նեյրոնային խիստ մտածելակերպը (NSR) ցույց է տալիս զարմանալի առաջընթաց խորը մոդելների և խիստ մտածելակերպների համադրման մեջ: However, we find that existing NDR solution suffers from large performance drop on hypothetical questions, e.g. \'what the annualized rate of return would be if the revenue in 2020 was doubled\'.  Հիպոթետիկ հարցերի պատասխանի (HQA) կարևորությունը հակափաստական մտածելն է, որը մարդկային մտածողության բնական ունակությունն է, բայց խորը մոդելների համար դժվար է: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք ստեղծում ենք "Պատկերացնելու սովորելու" (L2I) մոդուլը, որը կարելի է անհամակարգ ներառել ՀՆԱ մոդելների մեջ, որպեսզի կատարի անտեսանելի հակափաստերի երևակայությունը: Մենք հատկապես երկու քայլ ենք ձևավորում հակափաստական մտածելակերպը. 1) ներգրավելու փաստը և 2) հակափաստական մտածելակերպը ստանում ենք փաստից և ենթադրությունից, որոնք նախագծված են որպես նյարդային ցանցեր: Հաշվի առնելով ՏԱԹ-ԿԱ-ի վրա, մենք կառուցում ենք շատ դժվար ՀԿԱ-ի տվյալների համակարգ 8,283 հիպոթետիկ հարցերով: Մենք օգտագործում ենք նախագծված L2I-ը ՏԱԳՕՊ-ի համար, ՏԱԹ-ՔԱ-ի վերջին լուծումը, ստուգելով մեր մոտեցության ռացիոնալությունը և արդյունավետությունը:', 'bn': "নিউরেল বৈষম্যের কারণ (এনডিআর) গভীর মডেলের সাথে যুক্ত করার জন্য চমৎকার অগ্রগতি দেখিয়েছে। তবে আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে বিদ্যমান এনডিআর সমাধান হাইথিটিক্যাল প্রশ্নের বিরুদ্ধে বিশাল প্রকাশিত প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে কষ্ট পেয়েছে, যেমন '২০২০ সালে প্ হিপিটিক্যাল প্রশ্নের উত্তর (এইচকিউএ) চিন্তা হচ্ছে বিরোধী চিন্তা, যা মানুষের কারণের প্রাকৃতিক ক ক্ষমতা, কিন্তু গভীর ম এই কাজে আমরা কল্পনা করার জন্য শিক্ষা শিক্ষা নির্মাণ করি, যা সীমিতভাবে এনডিআর মডেলে যোগ দিতে পারে অদৃশ্য কল্পনা করার জন্য। বিশেষ করে, আমরা দুই পদক্ষেপে বিরোধী চিন্তা করি: ১) এই বাস্তবতাকে ইন্টারনেট করার জন্য চিহ্নিত করি, আর ২) এই বাস্তবতা এবং ধারণা থেকে প্রতিপক্ষের উদ্দেশ্ টাটি-কিউএ ভিত্তিতে আমরা একটি খুবই চ্যালেঞ্জালেঞ্জ হিকিউএ ডাটাসেট নির্মাণ করি, যার মাধ্যমে ৮,২৮৩ হিপাতিটিক We apply the proposed L2I to TAGOP, the state-of-the-art solution on TAT-QA, validating the rationality and effectiveness of our approach.", 'fi': 'Neuraalinen diskreettinen päättely (NDR) on osoittanut huomattavaa edistystä syvien mallien yhdistämisessä diskreettiin päättelyyn. Huomaamme kuitenkin, että nykyinen NDR-ratkaisu kärsii suuresta suorituskyvyn laskusta hypoteettisissa kysymyksissä, kuten "mikä vuosittainen tuottoaste olisi, jos liikevaihto vuonna 2020 kaksinkertaistuisi". Avain hypoteettiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen (HQA) on kontrafaktuaalinen ajattelu, joka on luonnollinen ihmisen päättelykyky, mutta vaikea syvälle malleille. Tässä työssä kehitämme Learning to Imagine (L2I) -moduulin, joka voidaan saumattomasti liittää NDR-malleihin suorittamaan näkymättömän kontrafaktuaalisen mielikuvituksen. Erityisesti muotoilemme kontrafaktuaalisen ajattelun kahteen vaiheeseen: 1) tunnistamaan sen tosiasian, johon puuttua, ja 2) johtamaan kontrafaktuaalisen tosiasian ja oletuksen perusteella, jotka on suunniteltu neuroverkoiksi. TAT-QA:n pohjalta rakennamme haastavan HQA-aineiston, jossa on 8 283 hypoteettista kysymystä. Sovellamme ehdotettua L2I:tä TAGOP-ratkaisuun, joka on TAT-laadunvarmistuksen huipputekninen ratkaisu, joka vahvistaa lähestymistapamme järkevyyden ja tehokkuuden.', 'et': 'Neuraalne diskreetne arutlus (NDR) on näidanud märkimisväärset edu sügavate mudelite kombineerimisel diskreetse arutlusega. Siiski leiame, et olemasolev NDR-lahendus kannatab hüpoteetiliste küsimuste puhul olulise tulemuslikkuse languse all, näiteks "milline oleks aastane tulumäär, kui tulu 2020. aastal kahekordistaks". Hüpoteetilise küsimustele vastamise võti on vastufaktuaalne mõtlemine, mis on loomulik inimese arutlusvõime, kuid raske sügavate mudelite jaoks. Selles töös töötame välja L2I mooduli, mida saab sujuvalt integreerida NDR mudelitesse, et täita nähtamatu vastufaktuaalse kujutlusvõimet. Eelkõige sõnastame vastufaktuaalse mõtlemise kaheks etapiks: 1) sekkumise fakti tuvastamine ja 2) vastufaktuaalse tuletamine faktist ja eeldusest, mis on kujundatud närvivõrkudena. TAT-QA põhjal ehitame väga keerulise HQA andmekogumi 8283 hüpoteetilise küsimusega. Me rakendame kavandatud L2I TAGOP-i, kaasaegse lahenduse TAT-QA kohta, kinnitades meie lähenemisviisi ratsionaalsust ja tõhusust.', 'jv': "outset Nanging, awak dhéwé luwih-luwih sabané NDR kuwi dianggap ndherek dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatik dhéwé. bisa 'teka sing beraksikno sing bakal terus teka bah sing bakal terus Perintah 2020 kuwi duwé sing apik dhéwé' yo. Apakno kanggo supoyo weruh-suaraning apa (HqA) kuwi kontoh nganggo barang weruh gak dhéwé, iki iso diagonan anyar sapa-sapa uwong, susahe kanggo model sing apik. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné sampeyan mrangkat aturan Learning to image (L2I), sing iso nguasai karo model NDR dumateng egal dumateng, iso nguasai perusahaan anyar mêng kuwi mau. 1) Ngawe nambah sing dibenakake perusahaan nganggep iki: 1) nambah sing perusahaan karo hal-hal, 2) nambah sing perusahaan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan karo hal-hal, iki dadi nambah layar lan tambah alat sing dibenakake opo Daftar mungkun, tata-KA, kita sampeyan mruput gak nggawe dataset HqA karo 8,2 hilipotetik sing apik. Awak dhéwé nggawe L2I nggawe aturan MGOP, negoro-perusahaan langgambar tarjamah lan saiki nggawe barang uripé awak dhéwé.", 'sk': 'Nevralno diskretno razmišljanje (NDR) je pokazalo izjemen napredek pri kombiniranju globokih modelov z diskretnim razmišljanjem. Vendar pa ugotavljamo, da obstoječa rešitev NDR trpi zaradi velikega upada uspešnosti pri hipotetičnih vprašanjih, npr. "kakšna bi bila letna stopnja donosa, če bi se prihodki leta 2020 podvojili". Ključ do hipotetičnega odgovarjanja na vprašanja je kontrafaktualno razmišljanje, ki je naravna sposobnost človeškega razmišljanja, vendar težko za globoke modele. V tem delu smo oblikovali modul Učenje predstavljati (L2I), ki ga je mogoče brezhibno vključiti v modele NDR in izvajati domišljijo nevidnega kontrafaktualnega. Predvsem oblikujemo kontrafaktualno razmišljanje v dva koraka: 1) prepoznavanje dejstva za posredovanje in 2) izpeljanje kontrafaktualnega iz dejstva in domneve, ki sta oblikovana kot nevronska omrežja. Na podlagi TAT-QA zgradimo zelo zahteven nabor podatkov HQA z 8.283 hipotetičnimi vprašanji. Predlagano L2I uporabljamo za TAGOP, najsodobnejšo rešitev za TAT-QA, ki potrjuje racionalnost in učinkovitost našega pristopa.', 'ha': 'Neural discrete reasoning (NDR) has shown remarkable progress in combining deep models with discrete reasoning.  Kayya, munã gane cewa rabon NDR masu cũtar da rabon aiki mai girma kan masu hushi, misali, "Ki ne rabin da za\'a rage a shekarar komai a 2020?" Maɓalli wa mai karɓa wa tambayi masu husũma (HQA) shi ne kafirar aiki mai motsi, wannan yana da awon mutum mai fassarawa kuma amma yana da nau\'i ga misãlai masu ƙari. Daga wannan aikin, Muke ƙayyade wani Learni wa Kayi Faso (L2I), wanda za\'a iya haɗa shi a cikin misalin NDR don a sami fikon bakin da ba\'a sani ba. Kayyaki, za\'a sami fikra masu motsi zuwa hanyõyi biyu: 1) za\'a gane gaskiya da za\'a shiga guda, da 2) daga gaskiya da zato, wanda aka ƙayyade su kamar zanen taryutan neura. Basan da TAT-QA, muna samun wani danne na HQA mai ƙiyayya da 8,283 masu tambayar ta\'ura. Tuna amfani da da aka buƙata L2I zuwa TAGP, halin-mai-fassarar masu fassarar-sanawa a kan TAT-QA, yana gaskata rasilinci da fassarar hanyarmu.', 'he': 'הגיון דיסקרטי נוירוני (NDR) הראה התקדמות מדהימה בשילוב דוגמנים עמוקים עם הגיון דיסקרטי. בכל אופן, אנו מוצאים שהפתרון הנוכחי של NDR סובל מפילה גדולה של ביצועים על שאלות היפותטיות, למשל "מה הקצב השנתי של החזרה יהיה אם הכנסה בשנת 2020 היה כפול". המפתח לענות על שאלות היפותטיות (HQA) הוא מחשבה נגד עובדות, שהיא יכולת טבעית של הגיון האנושי אבל קשה לדוגמנים עמוקים. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מתכננים מודול ללמוד לדמיין (L2I), שיכול להיות מעורב באופן בלתי מתאים לדוגמאות NDR כדי לבצע את הדמיון של פעולה לא נראית. במיוחד, אנו מייצרים מחשבה נגד עובדות לשני צעדים: 1) מזהה את העובדה להתערב, ו-2) מקבל את העובדה נגד עובדות מהעובדה וההנחה, שנועצבים כרשתות עצביות. בהתבסס על TAT-QA, אנחנו בונים קבוצת מידע מאד מאתגרת HQA עם 8,283 שאלות היפותטיות. אנו מכניסים את L2I המוצע לטאגופ, הפתרון המיוחד על טאט-קיי, מאשר את הגיונית והיעילות של הגישה שלנו.', 'bo': 'Neural discrete reasoning (NDR) has shown remarkable progress in combining deep models with discrete reasoning. ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་NDR་ཡི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་འདི་གྲངས་སུ་འབྱུང་བའི་ཚུལ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་རྐྱེན་བྱ་རྒྱུ་ཞིག མཐུན་པ་གཙོ་བོ་ལྟའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་བའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་counterfactual thinking(HQA)ཡིན། In this work, we devise a Learning to Imagine (L2I) module, which can be seamlessly incorporated into NDR models to perform the imagination of unseen counterfactual. Name In particular, we formulate counterfactual thinking into two steps: 1) identifying the fact to intervene, and 2) deriving the counterfactual from the fact and assumption, which are designed as neural networks. To identify the fact to intervene, and 2) deriving the counterfactual from the fact and assumption, which are designed as neural networks. འུ་ཅག་གིས་TAT-QA གནད་སྟེང་གཞི་བརྟེན་དེ་ HQA གནད་དོན་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཡིན་པའི་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་TAGOP་ལ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་L2I་དང་། TAT-QA་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གཤིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་དེ་ཉེན་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'e-', 'ar': 'تكييف المجال في إعدادات أحادية اللغة متعددة اللغات ومتعددة المجالات لتعريف الكلمات المعقدة', 'pt': 'Adaptação de domínio em configurações monolíngües multilíngues e de vários domínios para identificação de palavras complexas', 'es': 'Adaptación de dominios en entornos monolingües multilingües y multidominio para la identificación de palabras complejas', 'fr': "Adaptation de domaine dans des environnements multilingues et monolingues multidomaines pour l'identification de mots complexes", 'ja': '複雑な単語識別のための多言語および多ドメイン単一言語設定のドメイン適応', 'zh': '多言多域单语置中域适配,用于杂单词', 'ru': 'Адаптация домена в многоязычных и многодоменных одноязычных настройках для сложной идентификации слов', 'hi': 'जटिल Word पहचान के लिए बहुभाषी और बहु-डोमेन मोनोलिंगुअल सेटिंग्स में डोमेन अनुकूलन', 'ga': 'Oiriúnú Fearainn i Socruithe Aonteangacha Ilteangacha agus Ilfhearainn le haghaidh Aithint Focal Coimpléascach', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური და მრავალენგური მონოლენგური პარამეტრებში დიომენის ადაპტიფიკაცია', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή τομέα σε πολυγλωσσικές και πολυγλωσσικές μονογλωσσικές ρυθμίσεις για σύνθετη αναγνώριση λέξεων', 'hu': 'Domain adaptáció többnyelvű és több tartományban egynyelvű beállításokban komplex szóazonosításhoz', 'it': "Adattamento del dominio nelle impostazioni monolingue multilingue e multi-dominio per l'identificazione complessa delle parole", 'lt': 'Dominio pritaikymas daugiakalbėse ir daugiakalbėse monokalbėse sudėtingo žodžio identifikavimo nustatymuose', 'kk': 'Қосымша сөзді анықтау үшін көп тілді және көп- домен бірнеше тілді баптауларында домен адаптациясы', 'mk': 'Адаптација на домен во мултијазични и мултидомени монолингвални поставувања за комплексна идентификација на зборови', 'ms': 'Domain Adaptation in Multilingual and Multi-Domain Monolingual Settings for Complex Word Identification', 'ml': 'കമ്പ്ലെക്സ് വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള അഡ്യാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d പല ഭാഷയിലും പല- ഡൊമെയില്\u200d മോണോളില്\u200d ക്രമീകരണ', 'mt': 'Domain Adaptation in Multilingual and Multi-Domain Monolingual Settings for Complex Word Identification', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний болон олон доменын нэг хэлний тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолт', 'no': 'Domenetilpassing i fleirspråk og fleirdomeneinnstillingar for kompleks ord- identifikasjon', 'sr': 'Adaptacija domena u multijezičkim i multidomenalnim monojezičkim nastavama za kompleksno identifikaciju reči', 'ro': 'Adaptarea domeniului în setările monolingve multilingve și multidomenii pentru identificarea complexă a cuvintelor', 'pl': 'Adaptacja domeny w wielojęzycznych i wielojęzycznych ustawieniach jednojęzycznych dla złożonej identyfikacji słów', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් සහ ගොඩක් ඩෝමේන් එක්ක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සැකසුම් සම්පූර්ණ වචන පරික්ෂණය සඳහා ඩෝම', 'so': 'Adaptation Domain ku qoran luuqado badan iyo goobaha kala duduwan ee Finnishka la yaqaano', 'sv': 'Domänanpassning i flerspråkiga och flerspråkiga enspråksinställningar för komplex ordidentifiering', 'ta': 'தொகுப்பு வார்த்தை அடையாளத்திற்கான பல மொழி மற்றும் பல- டொமைன் மொன்மொழி அமைப்புகள்', 'ur': 'Multilingual and Multi-Domain Monolingual Settings for Complex Word Identification', 'uz': 'Domain Adaptation in Multilingual and Multi-Domain Monolingual Settings for Complex Word Identification', 'vi': 'Phục chỉnh miền trong thiết lập đa ngôn ngữ và đa miền đa ngôn ngữ cho nhận diện từ phức tạp', 'hr': 'Adaptacija domena u mnogijezičkim i mnogim domenama monolingičnim nastavima za kompleksno identifikaciju riječi', 'da': 'Domænetilpasning i flersprogede og flersprogede ensprogede indstillinger til kompleks ordidentifikation', 'nl': 'Domeinaanpassing in meertalige en meertalige eentalige instellingen voor complexe woordidentificatie', 'bg': 'Адаптация на домейн в многоезични и многодомейнови едноезични настройки за комплексна идентификация на думи', 'de': 'Domänenanpassung in mehrsprachigen und mehrdomänen einsprachigen Einstellungen für komplexe Worterkennung', 'id': 'Adaptasi Domain dalam Pengaturan Monolingual Multibahasa dan MultiDomain untuk Identifikasi Kata Kompleks', 'fa': 'تغییرات دامنی در تنظیمات مجموعه زبان و مجموعه دامنی برای شناسایی کلمات پیچیده', 'ko': '다국어와 다역 단어 환경에서 복잡한 단어 식별의 영역 적응', 'sw': 'Domain Adaptation in Multilingual and Multi-Domain Monolingual Settings for Complex Word Identification', 'am': 'ቋንቋ እና Multi-Domain Monolingual Settings for Complex Word Identification', 'tr': 'Birnäçe diller we köp-diller birleşdirme üçin ýerleşdirim', 'af': 'Domein Aanpassing in Veelvuldige en Veelvuldige Domein Monolinguele Instellings vir Kompleksie Woord Identifikasie', 'sq': 'Domain Adaptation in Multilingual and Multi-Domain Monolingual Settings for Complex Word Identification', 'hy': 'Դոմենյան ադապտացիան բազլեզվով և բազլեզվով դասավորումներում բարդ բառերի հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil və çoxlu Domena Monoli Dil Ayarları', 'bn': 'কমপ্লেক্স শব্দ পরিচিতির জন্য মাল্টিভাষা এবং বহুভাষী ডোমেইন মোনোলিভাল বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'bs': 'Adaptacija domena u mnogijezičkim i mnogim domenama monolingičnim nastavima za kompleksno identifikaciju riječi', 'ca': 'Adaptació de Dominis en Configuracions Monolingües Multillengües i MultiDominis per Identificar Palabras Complexes', 'fi': 'Verkkotunnuksen mukauttaminen monikielisissä ja monikielisissä yksikielisissä asetuksissa monimutkaista sanantunnistusta varten', 'et': 'Domeeni kohandamine mitmekeelsetes ja mitmekeelsetes ühekeelsetes seadetes keerulise sõna identifitseerimise jaoks', 'cs': 'Adaptace domény v multijazyčném a multidoménovém jednojjazyčném nastavení pro komplexní identifikaci slov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'domain Adjustment in Multilanguage and Multi-domain Monolngual settings for Completex Word ID', 'sk': 'Prilagajanje domene v večjezičnih in večdomenskih enojezičnih nastavitvah za kompleksno identifikacijo besed', 'he': 'התאמה של שטח בתערוכות מונולינגוליות רבות ושטחים רבים לזהות מילים מורכבות', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་མང་བོའི་དང་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ཐོག་ཁྲམ་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་འཛུགས་སྤྱོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Understanding causality has vital importance for various Natural Language Processing (NLP) applications. Beyond the labeled instances, conceptual explanations of the causality can provide deep understanding of the causal fact to facilitate the causal reasoning process. However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources. In this paper, we fill this gap by presenting a human-annotated explainable CAusal REasoning dataset (e-CARE), which contains over 20K causal reasoning questions, together with natural language formed explanations of the causal questions. Experimental results show that generating valid explanations for causal facts still remains especially challenging for the state-of-the-art models, and the explanation information can be helpful for promoting the accuracy and stability of causal reasoning models.', 'ar': 'يعد تحديد الكلمات المعقدة (CWI) عملية أساسية نحو تبسيط النص بشكل صحيح. تعتمد CWI بشكل كبير على السياق ، في حين أن الصعوبة تزداد بسبب ندرة مجموعات البيانات المتاحة التي تختلف اختلافًا كبيرًا من حيث المجالات واللغات. على هذا النحو ، يصبح من الصعب بشكل متزايد تطوير نموذج قوي يتم تعميمه عبر مجموعة واسعة من أمثلة المدخلات. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح تقنية تدريب جديدة لمهمة CWI تعتمد على تكييف المجال لتحسين الشخصية المستهدفة وتمثيلات السياق. تعالج هذه التقنية مشكلة العمل مع مجالات متعددة ، حيث إنها تخلق طريقة لتنعيم الاختلافات بين مجموعات البيانات المستكشفة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقترح أيضًا مهمة مساعدة مماثلة ، وهي تبسيط النص ، والتي يمكن استخدامها لاستكمال التنبؤ المعجمي بالتعقيد. حصل نموذجنا على دفعة تصل إلى 2.42٪ من حيث معاملات ارتباط بيرسون على عكس تقنيات تدريب الفانيليا ، عند النظر إلى CompLex من مجموعة بيانات توقع التعقيد المعجمي 2021. في الوقت نفسه ، حصلنا على زيادة بنسبة 3٪ في درجات Pearson ، مع التفكير في إعداد متعدد اللغات يعتمد على مجموعة بيانات تعريف الكلمات المعقدة 2018. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، ينتج عن نموذجنا نتائج متطورة من حيث متوسط الخطأ المطلق.', 'fr': "L'identification des mots complexes (CWI) est un processus fondamental vers une simplification correcte du texte. Le CWI dépend fortement du contexte, alors que sa difficulté est aggravée par la rareté des ensembles de données disponibles qui varient considérablement en termes de domaines et de langues. En tant que tel, il devient de plus en plus difficile de développer un modèle robuste qui généralise un large éventail d'exemples d'entrée. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle technique de formation pour la tâche CWI basée sur l'adaptation de domaine afin d'améliorer les représentations de caractères et de contextes cibles. Cette technique permet de résoudre le problème du travail avec plusieurs domaines, dans la mesure où elle permet de lisser les différences entre les ensembles de données explorés. En outre, nous proposons également une tâche auxiliaire similaire, à savoir la simplification du texte, qui peut être utilisée pour compléter la prédiction de complexité lexicale. Notre modèle obtient une augmentation allant jusqu'à 2,42\xa0% en termes de coefficients de corrélation de Pearson, contrairement aux techniques d'entraînement classiques, lorsque l'on considère le COMPLEX de l'ensemble de données Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. Dans le même temps, nous obtenons une augmentation de 3\xa0% des scores de Pearson, tout en envisageant une configuration multilingue basée sur l'ensemble de données Complex Word Identification 2018. De plus, notre modèle produit des résultats de pointe en termes d'erreur absolue moyenne.", 'es': 'La identificación de palabras complejas (CWI) es un proceso fundamental para la simplificación adecuada del texto. El CIT depende en gran medida del contexto, mientras que su dificultad se ve aumentada por la escasez de conjuntos de datos disponibles que varían mucho en términos de dominios e idiomas. Como tal, cada vez es más difícil desarrollar un modelo sólido que generalice en una amplia gama de ejemplos de entrada. En este artículo, proponemos una novedosa técnica de entrenamiento para la tarea del CIT basada en la adaptación de dominios para mejorar las representaciones de personajes y contextos objetivo. Esta técnica aborda el problema de trabajar con múltiples dominios, ya que crea una forma de suavizar las diferencias entre los conjuntos de datos explorados. Además, también proponemos una tarea auxiliar similar, a saber, la simplificación del texto, que se puede utilizar para complementar la predicción de la complejidad léxica. Nuestro modelo obtiene un aumento de hasta un 2,42% en términos de coeficientes de correlación de Pearson en contraste con las técnicas de entrenamiento estándar, al considerar el Complex del conjunto de datos Predicción de complejidad léxica 2021. Al mismo tiempo, obtenemos un aumento del 3% en las puntuaciones de Pearson, al tiempo que consideramos una configuración multilingüe basada en el conjunto de datos Complex Word Identification 2018. Además, nuestro modelo produce resultados de última generación en términos de error absoluto medio.', 'pt': 'A identificação de palavras complexas (CWI) é um processo fundamental para a simplificação adequada do texto. O CWI é altamente dependente do contexto, enquanto sua dificuldade é aumentada pela escassez de conjuntos de dados disponíveis que variam muito em termos de domínios e idiomas. Como tal, torna-se cada vez mais difícil desenvolver um modelo robusto que generalize em uma ampla gama de exemplos de entrada. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova técnica de treinamento para a tarefa CWI baseada na adaptação de domínio para melhorar as representações de caracteres e contextos alvo. Esta técnica aborda o problema de trabalhar com múltiplos domínios, na medida em que cria uma forma de suavizar as diferenças entre os conjuntos de dados explorados. Além disso, também propomos uma tarefa auxiliar semelhante, a simplificação de texto, que pode ser usada para complementar a previsão de complexidade lexical. Nosso modelo obtém um aumento de até 2,42% em termos de coeficientes de correlação de Pearson em contraste com as técnicas de treinamento vanilla, ao considerar o CompLex do conjunto de dados Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. Ao mesmo tempo, obtemos um aumento de 3% nas pontuações de Pearson, considerando uma configuração multilíngue com base no conjunto de dados Complex Word Identification 2018. Além disso, nosso modelo produz resultados de última geração em termos de erro médio absoluto.', 'hi': 'जटिल शब्द पहचान (सीडब्ल्यूआई) उचित पाठ सरलीकरण की दिशा में एक आधारशिला प्रक्रिया है। सीडब्ल्यूआई संदर्भ पर अत्यधिक निर्भर है, जबकि इसकी कठिनाई उपलब्ध डेटासेट की कमी से बढ़ी है जो डोमेन और भाषाओं के संदर्भ में बहुत भिन्न होती है। जैसे, एक मजबूत मॉडल विकसित करना तेजी से कठिन हो जाता है जो इनपुट उदाहरणों की एक विस्तृत सरणी में सामान्यीकरण करता है। इस पेपर में, हम लक्ष्य चरित्र और संदर्भ प्रतिनिधित्व में सुधार करने के लिए डोमेन अनुकूलन के आधार पर सीडब्ल्यूआई कार्य के लिए एक उपन्यास प्रशिक्षण तकनीक का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह तकनीक कई डोमेन के साथ काम करने की समस्या को संबोधित करती है, क्योंकि यह खोजे गए डेटासेट के बीच के अंतर को चिकना करने का एक तरीका बनाता है। इसके अलावा, हम एक समान सहायक कार्य का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अर्थात् पाठ सरलीकरण, जिसका उपयोग लेक्सिकल जटिलता भविष्यवाणी के पूरक के लिए किया जा सकता है। हमारा मॉडल वेनिला प्रशिक्षण तकनीकों के विपरीत पियर्सन सहसंबंध गुणांक के मामले में 2.42% तक का बढ़ावा प्राप्त करता है, जब लेक्सिकल जटिलता भविष्यवाणी 2021 डेटासेट से कॉम्पलेक्स पर विचार किया जाता है। उसी समय, हम पियर्सन स्कोर में 3% की वृद्धि प्राप्त करते हैं, जबकि जटिल वर्ड आइडेंटिफिकेशन 2018 डेटासेट पर भरोसा करते हुए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सेटअप पर विचार करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हमारे मॉडल का मतलब निरपेक्ष त्रुटि के संदर्भ में अत्याधुनिक परिणाम उपज.', 'ja': '複雑な単語識別（ CWI ）は、適切なテキスト簡略化に向けた基礎的なプロセスです。 CWIは文脈に大きく依存していますが、その難しさは利用可能なデータセットの希少性によって増大しており、ドメインや言語の点で大きく異なっています。 したがって、幅広い入力例にわたって一般化する堅牢なモデルを開発することがますます困難になる。 この論文では、対象の性格と文脈表現を改善するために、ドメイン適応に基づいたCWIタスクのための新規のトレーニング技術を提案します。 このテクニックは、探索されたデータセット間の差異を滑らかにする方法を作成するという点で、複数のドメインを操作する問題に対処します。 さらに、同様の補助的なタスク、すなわちテキストの簡略化も提案します。これは、語彙の複雑さ予測を補完するために使用できます。 当社のモデルは、Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021データセットのCompLexを考慮すると、バニラトレーニング技術とは対照的に、Pearson相関係数の観点から最大2.42%のブーストを得ます。 同時に、複雑な単語識別2018データセットに依存したクロスリンガル設定を検討しながら、Pearsonスコアは3%増加します。 さらに、当社のモデルは、平均絶対誤差の観点から最先端の結果をもたらします。', 'zh': '杂单词识(CWI)简文之基也。 CWI高赖于上下文,而其难则以数集之稀缺增之,其数在领语差异甚大。 是以发一以概诸输示例者鲁棒益难。 本文立域自宜CWI教习技艺,以善人语境。 此术解用数域者,以其创平滑所探数集之异也。 又陈一类之务,文本简化,可补词汇复杂性占。 方之训练,则吾法得达于皮尔逊相关系数2.42%,当思自2021年词汇复杂性占数集之CompLex。 同时得Pearson分数3%,兼虑赖2018年复杂单词识数集之跨语置之。 此外,我们的模样在平均绝对误差生最先进的。', 'ru': 'Комплексная идентификация слов (CWI) - это краеугольный камень процесса надлежащего упрощения текста. CWI сильно зависит от контекста, в то время как его трудность усугубляется нехваткой доступных наборов данных, которые сильно различаются по доменам и языкам. Как таковая, становится все труднее разработать надежную модель, которая обобщает широкий спектр входных примеров. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую методику обучения для задачи CWI на основе адаптации домена для улучшения представления целевого персонажа и контекста. Этот метод решает проблему работы с несколькими доменами, поскольку он создает способ сглаживания различий между исследуемыми наборами данных. Кроме того, мы также предлагаем аналогичную вспомогательную задачу, а именно упрощение текста, которая может быть использована для дополнения предсказания лексической сложности. Наша модель получает прирост до 2,42% с точки зрения коэффициентов корреляции Пирсона в отличие от методов обучения ванили, при рассмотрении CompLex из набора данных Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. В то же время мы получаем увеличение на 3% баллов Пирсона, рассматривая при этом межязыковую установку, опирающуюся на набор данных Complex Word Identification 2018. Кроме того, наша модель дает самые современные результаты с точки зрения средней абсолютной погрешности.', 'ga': 'Is próiseas bunchloch é sainaithint focal casta (CWI) chun téacs a shimpliú i gceart. Tá CWI ag brath go mór ar an gcomhthéacs, ach cuirtear lena dheacracht go bhfuil ganntanas tacair sonraí atá ar fáil agus a bhfuil éagsúlacht mhór acu ó thaobh fearainn agus teangacha de. Mar sin, bíonn sé ag éirí níos deacra múnla láidir a fhorbairt a dhéanann ginearálú thar raon leathan samplaí ionchuir. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid teicníc oiliúna nua do thasc an CWI bunaithe ar oiriúnú fearainn chun an sprioc-charachtar agus léirithe comhthéacs a fheabhsú. Tugann an teicníocht seo aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le hoibriú le fearainn iolracha, sa mhéid is go gcruthaíonn sé bealach chun na héagsúlachtaí idir na tacair shonraí iniúchta a réiteach. Ina theannta sin, molaimid freisin tasc cúnta comhchosúil, eadhon simpliú téacs, ar féidir a úsáid chun castacht na foclóireachta a thuar. Faigheann ár múnla treisiú suas le 2.42% i dtéarmaí Comhéifeachtaí Comhghaoil Pearson i gcodarsnacht le teicnící oiliúna fanaile, agus an CompLex ó thacar sonraí Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 á meas. Ag an am céanna, faighimid méadú 3% ar scóir Pearson, agus muid ag smaoineamh ar shocrú tras-teangach ag brath ar thacar sonraí Coimpléasc Aitheantais Focal 2018. Ina theannta sin, tugann ár múnla torthaí úrscothacha i dtéarmaí Meán-Earráid Iomlán.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების განსაზღვრება CWI კონტექსტიდან მნიშვნელოვანია, მაგრამ მისი რთული უფრო მეტივდება ხელსახური მონაცემების კონტექსტიდან, რომელიც ძალიან განსხვავებულია დიომენტების და ენაზე. როგორც ასე, უფრო რთული იქნება, რომ უფრო ძალიან მოდელის განვითარება, რომელიც გენერალიზებს უფრო დიდი მოდელის მაგალითად. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ შევძლებთ პრომენტის განაკლების ტექნოგია CWI დავალებისთვის დიომენტის ადაპექტირებაზე დაბაზეული, რომ გაუქმნოთ მისაღების კარგუტები და კ ამ ტექნექტიკის მისამართება რამდენიმე დომენთან მუშაობის პრობლემას, როგორც ის შექმნა გადასწორებული მონაცემების განსხვავება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ასევე მსგავსი დახმარებელი დავამუშავებთ, რომელიც ტექსტის დახმარება, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება ლექსიკური კომპლექსიკური წინახ ჩვენი მოდელი იღებს პერსონის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტების შესახებ 2.42%-ზე, როდესაც განილილის განაკეთება ტექნოგიების შესახებ, როდესაც პირსონის კოეფიციენტის კოეფიციენტის შესახებ, როდესაც პ იგივე დროში, ჩვენ პერсонის მონაცემებში 3%-ის გავაკეთებთ, როგორც გავფიქრობთ კრესტალური სიტყვების განსაცემების 2018 მონაცემების შესახებ. დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელი მოიცემს სახელსაწყისო შეცდომის შედეგების შედეგება.', 'hu': 'A komplex szóazonosítás (CWI) a megfelelő szövegegyszerűsítés sarokköve. A CWI nagymértékben függ a kontextustól, míg nehézségét a rendelkezésre álló adatkészletek hiánya fokozza, amelyek területenként és nyelvenként nagymértékben eltérnek. Így egyre nehezebbé válik egy olyan robusztus modell kidolgozása, amely általánosítja a bemeneti példák széles skáláját. Jelen tanulmányban egy új képzési technikát javasolunk a CWI feladathoz, amely tartomány adaptáción alapul a cél karakter és kontextus reprezentációk javítása érdekében. Ez a technika foglalkozik a több domainnel való munka problémájával, mivel lehetővé teszi a feltárt adatkészletek közötti különbségek kisimítását. Továbbá egy hasonló kiegészítő feladatot is javasolunk, nevezetesen a szöveg egyszerűsítését, amely a lexikai komplexitás előrejelzésének kiegészítésére használható. Modellünk akár 2,42%-os növekedést ér el a Pearson korrelációs együtthatók tekintetében a vanília edzési technikákkal szemben, ha figyelembe vesszük a Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 adatkészletből származó CompLexet. Ugyanakkor a Pearson pontszámok 3%-os növekedését érjük el, miközben figyelembe vesszük a komplex szóazonosító 2018-as adatkészletre épülő többnyelvű beállítást. Ezenkívül modellünk korszerű eredményeket hoz az átlagos abszolút hiba tekintetében.', 'el': 'Η σύνθετη ταυτοποίηση λέξεων (CWI) αποτελεί έναν ακρογωνιαίο λίθο για την ορθή απλοποίηση του κειμένου. Το CWI εξαρτάται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από το πλαίσιο, ενώ η δυσκολία του ενισχύεται από την έλλειψη διαθέσιμων συνόλων δεδομένων που διαφέρουν σημαντικά από την άποψη των τομέων και των γλωσσών. Ως εκ τούτου, γίνεται όλο και πιο δύσκολο να αναπτυχθεί ένα ισχυρό μοντέλο που γενικεύει σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα παραδειγμάτων εισαγωγής. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα τεχνική εκπαίδευσης για το έργο που βασίζεται στην προσαρμογή του τομέα για τη βελτίωση του χαρακτήρα του στόχου και των αναπαραστάσεων του πλαισίου. Η τεχνική αυτή αντιμετωπίζει το πρόβλημα της εργασίας με πολλαπλούς τομείς, δεδομένου ότι δημιουργεί έναν τρόπο εξομάλυνσης των διαφορών μεταξύ των διερευνημένων συνόλων δεδομένων. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε επίσης ένα παρόμοιο βοηθητικό έργο, δηλαδή απλοποίηση κειμένου, που μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για να συμπληρώσει την πρόβλεψη λεξικής πολυπλοκότητας. Το μοντέλο μας αποκτά μια ώθηση μέχρι 2,42% από την άποψη των συντελεστών συσχέτισης σε αντίθεση με τις τεχνικές εκπαίδευσης βανίλιας, όταν εξετάζεται το σύνολο δεδομένων της Προβολής Λεξικής πολυπλοκότητας 2021. Ταυτόχρονα, επιτυγχάνουμε αύξηση 3% στις βαθμολογίες της ενώ εξετάζουμε μια γλωσσική ρύθμιση βασιζόμενη στο σύνολο δεδομένων σύνθετης αναγνώρισης λέξεων 2018. Επιπλέον, το μοντέλο μας δίνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας όσον αφορά το μέσο απόλυτο σφάλμα.', 'kk': 'Қосымша сөздерді идентификациялау (CWI) бұрышты таш процесі дұрыс мәтінді қарапайымдастыру үшін. CWI контекстіне көп тәуелді, бірақ оның қиындығы домендер мен тілдер қасиетінде өзгертілген деректер қорларының қажеттілігін көтереді. Бұл секілде, бірнеше келтірілген мәселелерді жалпы түрлі үлгілерді жасауға көп қиын болады. Бұл қағазда, CWI тапсырмасының жаңа оқыту техникасын доменге негізделген адаптациялау үшін мақсатты таңбаларды және контексті таңбаларды жақсарту үшін қолданып тастайм Бұл техника бірнеше доменмен жұмыс істеу мәселесін шешу үшін, ол іздеген деректер жиындарының айырмашылығын жасайды. Сонымен қатар, біз мәтінді көмектесу тапсырмасын ұсындық. Мәтінді көмектесу, бұл лексикалық тәжірибеттік тапсырмасын қолдану үшін қолданылады. Біздің үлгіміз Персон коэффициенттеріне қарсы Ванилла оқыту технологияларына қарсы 2,42% көмектесу үшін, 2021 жылы Лексикалық толықтық бағдарламасының комплексін қарастыру үшін. Бірақ біз Персон нөмірлерінде 3% деңгейін өзгертіп, 2018- нің комплексті сөз идентификациясының көпшілік тілдерді баптауларын қарастырып тұрмыз. Қосымша, біздің үлгіміз орташа абсолютті қатенің нәтижесін береді.', 'lt': 'Complex word identification (CWI) is a cornerstone process towards proper text simplification.  CWI labai priklauso nuo konteksto, o sunkumus didina turimų duomenų rinkinių, kurie labai skiriasi srityse ir kalbomis, trūkumas. Todėl tampa vis sunkiau sukurti patikimą model į, kuris apimtų įvairius įvestus pavyzdžius. In this paper, we propose a novel training technique for the CWI task based on domain adaptation to improve the target character and context representations.  Šiuo metodu sprendžiama darbo su įvairiomis sritimis problem a, nes jame sukuriami būdai sušvelninti tirtų duomenų rinkinių skirtumus. Be to, mes taip pat siūlome panašią pagalbinę užduotį, būtent teksto supaprastinimą, kuri gali būti naudojama siekiant papildyti lexinio sudėtingumo prognozę. Mūsų modelis didina iki 2,42 % Pearson koreliacijos koeficientų atžvilgiu, palyginti su vanilės mokymo metodais, svarstant kompleksą iš Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 duomenų rinkinio. Tuo pačiu metu mes gauname Pearson rezultatų padidėjimą 3 proc., svarstant tarpkalbinę struktūrą, grindžiamą 2018 m. kompleksinio žodžio identifikavimo duomenų rinkiniu. Be to, mūsų modelis duoda naujausių rezultatų vidutinės absoliučios klaidos atžvilgiu.', 'it': "L'identificazione complessa delle parole (CWI) è un processo fondamentale per una corretta semplificazione del testo. CWI dipende fortemente dal contesto, mentre la sua difficoltà è aggravata dalla scarsità di set di dati disponibili che variano notevolmente in termini di domini e lingue. Come tale, diventa sempre più difficile sviluppare un modello robusto che si generalizzi su una vasta gamma di esempi di input. In questo articolo, proponiamo una nuova tecnica di formazione per il compito CWI basata sull'adattamento del dominio per migliorare il carattere target e le rappresentazioni del contesto. Questa tecnica affronta il problema di lavorare con più domini, in quanto crea un modo per appianare le differenze tra i dataset esplorati. Inoltre, proponiamo anche un compito ausiliario simile, vale a dire la semplificazione del testo, che può essere utilizzato per integrare la previsione della complessità lessicale. Il nostro modello ottiene una spinta fino al 2,42% in termini di coefficienti di correlazione Pearson rispetto alle tecniche di allenamento alla vaniglia, considerando il CompLex dal dataset Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. Allo stesso tempo, otteniamo un aumento del 3% dei punteggi Pearson, considerando un setup cross-lingual basato sul set di dati Complex Word Identification 2018. Inoltre, il nostro modello fornisce risultati all'avanguardia in termini di errore assoluto medio.", 'ms': 'Complex word identification (CWI) is a cornerstone process towards proper text simplification.  CWI is highly dependent on context, whereas its difficulty is augmented by the scarcity of available datasets which vary greatly in terms of domains and languages.  Sebagai demikian, ia menjadi semakin sukar untuk mengembangkan model yang kuat yang menyebarkan melalui banyak contoh input. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan teknik latihan baru untuk tugas CWI berdasarkan penyesuaian domain untuk memperbaiki aksara sasaran dan perwakilan konteks. Teknik ini mengatasi masalah kerja dengan domain berbilang, sebagaimana ia mencipta cara untuk menyesuaikan perbezaan antara set data yang dikeksplorasi. Lagipun, kami juga melamar tugas bantuan yang sama, iaitu pemudahan teks, yang boleh digunakan untuk menambahkan ramalan kompleksiti leksik. Model kami mendapat peningkatan sehingga 2.42% dalam terma Pearson Correlation Coefficients dalam perbandingan dengan teknik latihan vanilla, apabila mempertimbangkan CompLex dari set data Prediksi Kompleksi Lexical 2021. Pada masa yang sama, kita mendapat peningkatan 3% dalam skor Pearson, sementara mempertimbangkan seting saling bahasa bergantung pada set data Identifikasi Perkataan Kompleks 2018. Selain itu, model kita menghasilkan hasil state-of-the-art dalam terma Kesatuan Ralat Absolut.', 'ml': 'കോമ്പ്ലെക്സ് വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് (സിവിഐ) ശരിയായ പദാവലിയുടെ എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200d സിഡമെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെയും ഭാഷകളുടെയും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെയും പ്രയാസങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുപോലെ, ഒരു റോബോസ്റ്റ് മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുന്നു. അത് ഒരു വിശാലമായ അളവിലുള്ള ഉപമകളില്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സിഡമിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന് ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ടെക ഈ ടെക്നിക്ക് പല ഡോമെനെനുകളുമായി ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അത് പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മളും ഒരു പോലെയുള്ള ഒരു ജോലി പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ടെക്സ്റ്റ് എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്നു. അത് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d കോമ്പ്ലെക്സിറ്റിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള കമ്പോള്\u200dക്സിറ്റി പ്രിക്സിക്സിക്സിക്സിക്സിറ്റി പ്രിക്സിക്സിറ്റി 2021 ഡാറ്റാസങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ക At the same time, we obtain an increase of 3% in Pearson scores, while considering a cross-lingual setup relying on the Complex Word Identification 2018 dataset.  അതുകൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിതിയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. മെയിന്\u200d തീര്\u200dത്തും പിശകുകള്\u200d എന്ന', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni kumplessa tal-kelma (CWI) hija proċess ta’ pedament lejn simplifikazzjoni xierqa tat-test. Is-CWI tiddependi ħafna mill-kuntest, filwaqt li d-diffikultà tagħha tiżdied mill-iskarsezza ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta disponibbli li jvarjaw ħafna f’termini ta’ dominji u lingwi. Bħala tali, isir dejjem aktar diffiċli li jiġi żviluppat mudell robust li jiġġeneralizza fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ eżempji ta’ input. In this paper, we propose a novel training technique for the CWI task based on domain adaptation to improve the target character and context representations.  Din it-teknika tindirizza l-problem a tal-ħidma ma’ diversi oqsma, sakemm toħloq mod kif jitnaqqsu d-differenzi bejn is-settijiet tad-dejta esplorati. Barra minn hekk, nipproponu wkoll kompitu awżiljarju simili, jiġifieri s-simplifikazzjoni tat-test, li jista’ jintuża biex jikkumplimenta t-tbassir tal-kumplessità lexika. Our model obtains a boost of up to 2.42% in terms of Pearson Correlation Coefficients in contrast to vanilla training techniques, when considering the CompLex from the Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 dataset.  Fl-istess ħin, inkisbu żieda ta’ 3% fil-punteġġi Pearson, filwaqt li nikkunsidraw struttura translingwistika li tiddependi fuq is-sett tad-dejta tal-Identifikazzjoni Komplessa tal-Kliem 2018. Barra minn hekk, il-mudell tagħna jagħti riżultati l-aktar avvanzati f’termini ta’ Żball Absolut Medju.', 'mn': 'Комплекс үгний тодорхойлолт (CWI) нь зөв текст хялбарлалтын тулд булан чулуу процесс юм. ДОХ-ын холбоотой байдлаас маш их хамааралтай. Гэхдээ үүнийг хэцүү байдлаас хамааралтай өгөгдлийн сангуудын хэмжээнд маш их өөрчлөгдөж байна. Ийм төрлийн арга хэмжээнд хүчтэй загвар хөгжүүлэх нь илүү хэцүү болж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид CWI ажлын шинэ сургалтын техник сургалтыг зориулагдсан зориулалт болон нөхцөл байдлыг илүү сайжруулахын тулд зориулагдсан зориулагдсан зориулалт. Энэ техник олон хэсэгт ажиллах асуудлыг тайлбарладаг. Энэ нь судалсан өгөгдлийн сандын ялгааг сайжруулах арга замыг бий болгодог. Мөн бид мөн адилхан тусламжтай ажил, мөн текстэй хялбарчлал, лексикийн төвөгтэй тодорхойлолтыг нэмэхэд ашиглаж болно. Бидний загварын загвар нь Персон Шулгалтын Коэффициентүүдийн хувьд 2.42%-аас илүү нэмэгдүүлдэг. 2021 оны өгөгдлийн санаагаар комплексийг ажиглаж байхдаа vanilla сургалтын техникуудын хувьд ялгаатай. Гэвч бид Персон оноо дээр 3%-аар нэмэгдсэн. 2018 оны комплекс үгийн идентификацийн өгөгдлийн сан дээр байдаг олон хэлний суурь байгууллага гэж бодож байна. Мөн бидний загвар нь урлагийн төвшин төвшин абсолютт алдаа гэсэн үг бий болгодог.', 'no': 'Komplekt ordidentifikasjon (CWI) er ein hjørnsteiningsprosess mot rett tekstforenkling. CWI er svært avhengig av kontekst, men vanskeligheten blir auka av nedgang av tilgjengelege datasett som varierer mykje med domene og språk. Som slik blir det mer vanskeleg å utvikla ein robust modell som genereliserer gjennom eit brett rekkjefølgje for eksemplar på inndata. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt treningsteknikk for CWI-oppgåva basert på domenetilpassing for å forbetra målteksten og kontekstrepresentasjonane. Denne teknikken adresserer problemet med å arbeide med fleire domene, fordi det lagar ein måte å gjera ulike forskjeller mellom dei utforska datasetta. I tillegg foreslår vi også ein liknande hjelpeoppgåve, som er tekstforenkling, som kan brukast til å komplemera foregåve av leksiske kompleksitet. Modellen vårt får opp til 2,42% i tillegg til Pearson Correlation Coefficients i contrast til vanilla training techniques, når det gjer opp med CompLex frå datasettet «Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021». Samtidig får vi ei økning av 3% i Pearson- poeng, mens vi ser på eit krysspråksoppsett som tilhøyrer datasettet for kompleks ordidentifikasjon 2018. I tillegg vil modellen vårt gjennomsnittsfeil gjennomsnittsfeil gjennomsnittsfeil.', 'pl': 'Złożona identyfikacja słów (CWI) jest podstawą procesu właściwego uproszczenia tekstu. CWI jest w dużym stopniu uzależniony od kontekstu, podczas gdy jego trudność jest zwiększona przez niedobór dostępnych zbiorów danych, które znacznie różnią się pod względem domen i języków. W związku z tym coraz trudniej jest opracować solidny model uogólniający szeroki wachlarz przykładów wejściowych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowatorską technikę treningową dla zadania CWI opartą na adaptacji domeny w celu poprawy charakteru docelowego i reprezentacji kontekstu. Technika ta rozwiązuje problem pracy z wieloma domenami, ponieważ tworzy sposób na wygładzenie różnic między zbadanymi zbiorami danych. Ponadto proponujemy również podobne zadanie pomocnicze, a mianowicie uproszczenie tekstu, które może być wykorzystane do uzupełnienia przewidywania złożoności leksykalnej. Nasz model uzyskuje wzrost do 2,42% pod względem współczynników korelacji Pearsona w przeciwieństwie do technik treningowych waniliowych, biorąc pod uwagę CompLex z zestawu danych Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. Jednocześnie uzyskujemy wzrost 3% wyników Pearsona, rozważając konfigurację wielojęzyczną opartą na zbiorze danych Complex Word Identification 2018. Ponadto nasz model daje najnowocześniejsze wyniki w zakresie średniego błędu absolutnego.', 'sr': 'Kompleksna identifikacija reèi (CWI) je proces kamena ugla prema pravom pojednostavljanju teksta. CWI je veoma zavisna od konteksta, dok joj je teškoća povećala nedostatak dostupnih seta podataka koji se veoma razlikuju u smislu domena i jezika. Kao takvo, postaje sve teže razviti robni model koji generalizuje širok niz primjera ulaska. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu tehniku obuke za zadatak CWI na temelju adaptacije domena za poboljšanje ciljnog karaktera i konteksta. Ova tehnika rješava problem rada sa višestrukim domenama, jer stvara način da olakša razlike između istraženih podataka. Osim toga, takođe predlažemo sličan pomoćni zadatak, a to je pojednostavljanje teksta, koji se može koristiti za dodatno predviđanje leksičke kompleksnosti. Naš model dobija povećanje do 2,42% u odnosu na koeficijente korištenja Pearson a u suprotnost sa tehnikama obuke vanile, kad razmatramo kompleks iz predviđanja leksičke kompleksnosti 2021. U isto vreme, dobijemo povećanje od 3% u Pearsonovim rezultatima, dok razmatramo preko jezičkog seta koji se oslanja na kompleksnoj identifikaciji reči 2018. Osim toga, naš model daje rezultate umetnosti u smislu srednje apsolutne greške.', 'ro': 'Identificarea complexă a cuvintelor (CWI) reprezintă un proces de bază pentru simplificarea corespunzătoare a textului. CWI depinde în mare măsură de context, în timp ce dificultatea sa este accentuată de deficitul seturilor de date disponibile, care variază foarte mult în ceea ce privește domeniile și limbile. Ca atare, devine din ce în ce mai dificilă dezvoltarea unui model robust care să generalizeze într-o gamă largă de exemple de intrare. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă tehnică de instruire pentru sarcina CWI bazată pe adaptarea domeniului pentru a îmbunătăți caracterul țintă și reprezentările contextului. Această tehnică abordează problema lucrului cu mai multe domenii, în măsura în care creează o modalitate de netezire a diferențelor dintre seturile de date explorate. Mai mult decât atât, propunem și o sarcină auxiliară similară, și anume simplificarea textului, care poate fi folosită pentru a completa predicția complexității lexicale. Modelul nostru obține un impuls de până la 2,42% în ceea ce privește coeficienții de corelație Pearson, spre deosebire de tehnicile de antrenament cu vanilie, atunci când luăm în considerare CompLex din setul de date Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. În același timp, obținem o creștere de 3% a scorurilor Pearson, luând în considerare o configurație cross-lingvistică bazată pe setul de date Complex Word Identification 2018. În plus, modelul nostru oferă rezultate de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește eroarea absolută medie.', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ වචන පරීක්ෂණය (CWI) යුක්තිය පාළුව සමාන්\u200dය කරන්න ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරමයක්. CWI ගොඩක් සංවේදනය විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාසයි, ඒ වගේම එයාගේ අමාර්\u200dයය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ පුළුවන් තොරතුරු සේට් වලින් ප්\u200dර ඒ වගේම, ඒක තරම් වැඩිය අමාරුයි වෙන්නේ ශක්තිමත් නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ කරනවා ඇ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා CWI වැඩ සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ලක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සංවේද මේ තාක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ විශ්වාස විදිහට වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒක හොයාගත්ත දත්ත සේට් අතර වෙනස් විදිහට සැලසුම ඒවගේම, අපි සමහර විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒක තමයි ලෙක්සික් සංකේතිකතාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූ අපේ මදුල්ය 2.42% වෙනුවෙන් පියර්සන් සම්පූර්ණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින් වැනිලා ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණාත්මක විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, ලෙක්සිකාල් සම එකම වෙලාවෙන්, අපි පියර්සන් ස්කෝට් වල 3% විශාලයක් ලැබෙනවා, ක්\u200dරිස් භාෂාවක් සැකසුම් ගැන හිතන්නේ සම්පූර්ණ වචන පරි ඒ වගේම, අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක තත්වයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'ta': 'சிக்கல் வார்த்தை அடையாளம் (CWI) சரியான உரை எளிதாக்குதலுக்கு ஒரு மூலைகல் செயல் CWI மிகவும் சார்ந்திருக்கிறது, ஆனால் அதன் கடினம் கிடைக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் குறைவாக அதிகரிக்கப்படுகிறது, அது களங்கள் மற்றும் ம இது போன்று, ஒரு ரோப்ட் மாதிரி உருவாக்குவதற்கு அதிகமாக கடினமாக இருக்கும், அது ஒரு நிறைய உள்ளீடு உதாரணங்களை முழுவதும் பொ In this paper, we propose a novel training technique for the CWI task based on domain adaptation to improve the target character and context representations.  இந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் பல களங்களுடன் வேலை செய்யும் பிரச்சனையை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, ஏனெனில் அது தெரிந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் தகவல மேலும், நாம் அதே போன்ற ஒரு சேர்ப்பு பணியை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம், அதாவது உரை எளிதாக்குதல், அது லெக்சிக்சியல் சிக்கல் முன் எங்கள் மாதிரி 2. 42% மேல் அதிகரிக்கும் பெயர்சன் கார்சன் செயல்பாடுகளை வெற்றிட பயிற்சி தொழில்நுட்பத்திற்கு எதிராக இருக்கும், லெக்சிக்சியல் சிக்கல் விக அதே நேரத்தில், நாம் பீர்சன் மதிப்புகளில் 3% அதிகமாக பெறுகிறோம், கூட்டல் வார்த்தை அடையாளம் 2018 தகவல் அமைப்புகளை நம்புகிற கூடிய மொழி அமை மேலும், எங்கள் மாதிரி மதிப்பு முழுமையான பிழையின் முடிவுகளை கொடுக்கும்.', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga hadalka kaamilka ah (CWI) waa sameynta dhagaxa geeska ah oo u jeeda fududeynta qoraalka saxda ah. CWI aad buu ku xiran yahay daboolka, iyadoo ay dhibaatadeedii ku sii kordhisaa dhibaatooyin ay ku jirto kooxaha macluumaadka la heli karo, kuwaas oo aad u kala duwan yihiin sida loo kala duwan yahay deegaanka iyo luuqadaha. Sida darteed waxaa si adag u sii adag in la horumariyo model roboti oo ku soo daabacaa tusaalooyin badan oo laga soo saaray. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal waxbarasho oo saxda ah oo ku saleysan habboonaanta domain si aan u hagaajinno xarafta kaarka iyo kooxda noocyada. Teknonikadan wuxuu ku saabsan dhibaatada la shaqeynta meelo kala duduwan, sababtoo ah waxay sameeyaa qaab ku simid kala duwanaanshaha labada danbiyood dhexdooda. Sidoo kale waxaynu horumarinnaa shuqul la mid ah, tusaale ahaan fududeynta qoraalka, taas oo loo isticmaali karo in la dhammeeyo wixii la soo sheegay dhibaatada lexicka. Tusaalkayaga waxay korodhsadaan ugu badnaan 2.42% si ka duwan kooxaha Pearson Correlation, taasoo ka horjeeda teknikada waxbarashada ee vanilla ah, marka aad ka fikirayso CompLex xafiiska leksiga 2021. Isla waqtigaas, waxaynu helaynaa kordhiska kooxaha Pearson oo 3% ah, marka a an ka fiirsanayno qoraal af kala duwan oo ku xiran aqoonsashada hadalka Complex ee 2018. Intaas waxaa dheer, modellkayaga ayaa soo saara xaalad farshaxan ah oo ku saabsan khaladda dhamaanta ah.', 'sv': 'Komplex ordidentifiering (CWI) är en hörnstensprocess mot korrekt textförenkling. CWI är i hög grad beroende av sammanhang, medan dess svårighet förstärks av bristen på tillgängliga datamängder som varierar kraftigt i fråga om domäner och språk. Som sådan blir det allt svårare att utveckla en robust modell som generaliserar över ett brett spektrum av inmatningsexempel. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny utbildningsteknik för CWI-uppgiften baserad på domänanpassning för att förbättra målkaraktär och kontextrepresentationer. Denna teknik behandlar problemet med att arbeta med flera domäner, eftersom den skapar ett sätt att jämna ut skillnaderna mellan de undersökta datauppsättningarna. Dessutom föreslår vi också en liknande hjälpuppgift, nämligen textförenkling, som kan användas för att komplettera lexikal komplexitetsprediktion. Vår modell får en boost på upp till 2,42% i termer av Pearson korrelationskoefficienter i motsats till vanilj träningstekniker, när man överväger CompLex från Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 datauppsättningen. Samtidigt får vi en ökning med 3% i Pearson poäng, samtidigt som vi överväger en tvärspråkig konfiguration baserad på datauppsättningen Complex Word Identification 2018. Dessutom ger vår modell toppmoderna resultat i termer av medelabsolutt fel.', 'ur': 'مکمل کلمات شناسایی (CWI) ایک کانٹ پتھر کی پروسس ہے ٹھیک متن سازونی کی طرف۔ CWI محیط پر بہت زیادہ اعتماد ہے، حالانکہ اس کا مشکل دسترسی دسترسی ڈیٹسٹ کے ذریعہ بڑھا جاتا ہے جو ڈیمین اور زبانوں کے اندر بہت زیادہ متفاوت ہیں. اس طرح، ایک مضبوط موڈل کو ایجاد کرنے کے لئے زیادہ مشکل ہو جاتا ہے جو ایک گھیری جمع مثالوں میں مشکل کرتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے CWI تابع کے لئے ایک نئی تدریس ٹیکنیک پیشنهاد کرتا ہے تابع شخصیت اور کنٹنسیٹ نمایش کی تدریس کے لئے ڈومین ادامہ پر بنیاد رکھا ہے. یہ تکنیک بہت سی ڈومین کے ساتھ کام کرنے کے مسئلہ کا مشکل سمجھتا ہے، جیسے اس نے جہاد کی ڈاٹ سٹ کے درمیان اختلاف کا ایک طریقہ ٹھنڈا بنایا ہے. اور ہم نے بھی ایک جیسی مددگار کام کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہیں، یعنی پیغام سادگاری، جو لکسیکل پیچیدگی کی پیشنهاد کی تعداد کے لئے استعمال کی جاتی ہے۔ ہماری مدل پیرسون کی اصلاح کوفیکسٹ کے معاملہ میں 2.42% تک زیادہ اضافہ حاصل کرتا ہے، جب کہ پیرسون کی اصلاح کوفیکسٹ کے معاملہ میں بنیالی ترین ٹیکنسٹ کے مقابلہ میں کاملکس کو لکسیکل کاملکسٹی کی پیش بینی 2021 ڈیٹ سٹ سے دیکھتے ہیں۔ اسی طرح، ہم پر پرسون اسکوروں میں 3% زیادہ اضافہ حاصل کرتے ہیں، حالانکہ ایک کرس زبان سٹاپ کی توقع کرتا ہے جو کاملکس ورڈ شناسیٹ 2018 ڈیٹسٹ پر بھروسہ ہے. اس کے علاوہ، ہماری مدل مطابق غلطی کے معاملہ میں موجود ہے.', 'mk': 'Комплексната идентификација на зборот (CWI) е процес на камен на аголот кон соодветно спроведување на текстот. ЦВИ е многу зависна од контекст, додека нејзините тешкотии се зголемуваат од недостатокот на достапни датотеки кои се многу различни во поглед на домените и јазиците. As such, it becomes increasingly more difficult to develop a robust model that generalizes across a wide array of input examples.  In this paper, we propose a novel training technique for the CWI task based on domain adaptation to improve the target character and context representations.  Оваа техника го решава проблемот со работата со повеќе домени, во оглед на тоа што создава начин да се разликуваат разликите помеѓу истражуваните податоци. Покрај тоа, ние, исто така, предложуваме слична помошна задача, именувајќи го поедноставувањето на текстот, која може да се користи за дополнително предвидување на лексикалната комплексност. Our model obtains a boost of up to 2.42% in terms of Pearson Correlation Coefficients in contrast to vanilla training techniques, when considering the CompLex from the Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 dataset.  Истовремено, добиваме зголемување од 3 отсто на резултатите на Пирсон, при што размислуваме за прекујазична поставка која зависи од комплексната идентификација на зборови 2018. Покрај тоа, нашиот модел дава најдобри резултати во однос на просечна апсолутна грешка.', 'vi': "Sự nhận dạng từ phức tạp (CWI) là một quy trình cốt yếu để làm đơn giản văn bản. CWI rất phụ thuộc vào ngữ cảnh, trong khi khó khăn của nó được tăng lên bởi sự thiếu hụt các bộ dữ liệu có thể cung cấp, rất nhiều về miền và ngôn ngữ. Do đó, việc phát triển một mô hình vững chắc sẽ càng khó khăn hơn khi tổng hợp các loại ví dụ về nhập. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một kỹ thuật huấn luyện mới cho việc của CWI, dựa trên việc thích nghi miền để cải thiện biểu tượng tiêu biểu và ngữ cảnh. Phương pháp này giải quyết vấn đề làm việc với nhiều miền, vì nó tạo ra một cách làm giảm sự khác biệt giữa các tập tin được khám phá. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cũng đề xuất một nhiệm vụ hỗ trợ tương tự, như là đơn giản văn bản, có thể được dùng để dự đoán tính phức tạp ngôn ngữ. Trong mô hình của chúng tôi có một tăng cường lên lên tới 2.2.2=.=.=forPierson Correctional Coengements in different to vani training technique, when considering the CompLex from the Lexical Complxity prediction 2021 dataset. Đồng thời, chúng tôi nhận được một tăng cao 3='trong điểm của Pearson, Trong khi cân nhắc một thiết lập chữ thập-ngôn ngữ nhờ vào bộ dữ liệu Tưởng tượng từ phức tạp thẩm thẩm thẩm diễn ra bây giờ. Hơn nữa, mẫu của chúng tôi cung cấp kết quả hiện đại theo mức độ dữ dội nhất.", 'uz': "Name Name As such, it becomes increasingly more difficult to develop a robust model that generalizes across a wide array of input examples.  Bu hujjatda, biz domen adapterining asosida CWI vazifasini bajarish uchun yangi taʼminlovchi teknologini talab qilamiz. Bu teknikani bir nechta domen bilan ishlash muammolarini anglatadi, chunki u qidirilgan maʼlumot satrlarining o'zgarishlarini o'zgartirish usulini yaratadi. Шунингдек, биз ҳам унга ўхшаш маълумотлар вазифасини тақдим этамиз, Матн осончиликни, бу Лексиский компликликни тақдим этиш учун фойдаланиш мумкин. Bizning modelimiz 2021 maʼlumotlar 2021 ta'limdan komplekksni tasavvur qilayotganda o'zgarishga ega bo'lganda, Pearson Correlation effektlariga 2.42% ko'payadi. Shunday paytda, biz Pearson scorlarida 3% ko'payapmiz, va 2018 maʼlumot etish tugmasini qidirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik esa, modelmiz umumiy xato haqida holatning holatini chiqaradi.", 'bg': 'Сложната идентификация на думи е крайъгълен процес към правилното опростяване на текста. CWI е силно зависима от контекста, докато трудността му се увеличава от недостига на налични набори от данни, които варират значително по отношение на домейни и езици. Като такъв става все по-трудно да се разработи стабилен модел, който обобщава широк спектър от входни примери. В настоящата статия предлагаме нова обучителна техника за задачата, базирана на адаптация на домейна, за да подобрим представянето на целевия характер и контекста. Тази техника разглежда проблема с работата с множество домейни, доколкото създава начин за изглаждане на разликите между изследваните набори от данни. Освен това предлагаме подобна спомагателна задача, а именно опростяване на текста, която може да се използва за допълване на прогнозирането на лексикалната сложност. Нашият модел получава повишение от до 2.42% по отношение на коефициентите на корелация на Пиърсън за разлика от техниките за обучение с ванилия, когато се разглежда Комплекс от набора данни за прогноза за лексикална сложност 2021. В същото време получаваме увеличение с 3% в оценките на Пиърсън, като разглеждаме междуезична настройка, която се основава на набор от данни за комплексна идентификация на думи 2018. Освен това нашият модел дава най-съвременни резултати по отношение на средната абсолютна грешка.', 'hr': 'Kompleksa identifikacija riječi (CWI) je proces uglovnog kamena prema pravom pojednostavljanju teksta. CWI je vrlo zavisna od konteksta, dok joj je teškoća povećala nedostatak dostupnih podataka koje se veoma razlikuju u smislu domena i jezika. Kao što je tako, postaje sve teže razviti jak model koji generalizira širok niz primjera ulaska. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu tehniku obuke za zadatak CWI-a temeljenu na prilagodbi domena za poboljšanje ciljnog karaktera i konteksta. Ova tehnika rješava problem rada s višestrukim domenama, jer stvara način da olakša razlike između istraženih podataka. Također predlažemo sličan pomoćni zadatak, a to je pojednostavljanje teksta, koji se može koristiti za dodavanje predviđanja leksičke složenosti. Naš model dobiva povećanje do 2,42% u smislu koeficijenata Pearson korištenja u suprotnosti s tehnikama obuke vanile, u razmatranju kompleksa iz predviđenja podataka o leksičkoj kompleksnosti 2021. godine. U isto vrijeme, dobijemo povećanje od 3% u Pearsonovim rezultatima, s obzirom na cross-lingual setup koji se oslanja na kompleksnoj identifikaciji riječi 2018. Osim toga, naš model daje rezultate umjetnosti u smislu srednje apsolutne greške.', 'nl': 'Complex word identification (CWI) is een hoeksteen voor een correcte tekstvereenvoudiging. CWI is sterk afhankelijk van context, terwijl de moeilijkheid ervan wordt vergroot door de schaarste aan beschikbare datasets die sterk verschillen in domeinen en talen. Als zodanig wordt het steeds moeilijker om een robuust model te ontwikkelen dat generaliseert over een breed scala aan invoervoorbeelden. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe trainingstechniek voor voor de CWI-taak gebaseerd op domeinaanpassing om het doelkarakter en de contextrepresentatie te verbeteren. Deze techniek behandelt het probleem van werken met meerdere domeinen, aangezien het een manier creëert om de verschillen tussen de verkende datasets glad te maken. Bovendien stellen we ook een soortgelijke hulptaak voor, namelijk tekstvereenvoudiging, die kan worden gebruikt om lexicale complexiteitsvoorspelling aan te vullen. Ons model verkrijgt een boost van tot 2,42% in termen van Pearson Correlation Coefficients in tegenstelling tot vanille trainingstechnieken, bij het overwegen van de CompLex uit de Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 dataset. Tegelijkertijd krijgen we een verhoging van 3% in Pearson scores, terwijl we overwegen een cross-lingual setup op basis van de Complex Word Identification 2018 dataset. Daarnaast levert ons model state-of-the-art resultaten op in termen van Mean Absolute Error.', 'da': 'Kompleks ordidentifikation (CWI) er en hjørnestensproces i retning af en ordentlig forenkling af teksten. CWI er i høj grad afhængig af sammenhæng, mens dens vanskeligheder forstærkes af manglen på tilgængelige datasæt, som varierer meget med hensyn til domæner og sprog. Som sådan bliver det stadig vanskeligere at udvikle en robust model, der generaliserer på tværs af en bred vifte af input eksempler. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny træningsteknik til CWI-opgaven baseret på domænetilpasning for at forbedre målkarakteren og kontekst repræsentationer. Denne teknik løser problemet med at arbejde med flere domæner, da den skaber en måde at udjævne forskellene mellem de undersøgte datasæt. Desuden foreslår vi også en lignende hjælpeopgave, nemlig tekstforenkling, der kan bruges til at supplere forudsigelse af leksikalsk kompleksitet. Vores model opnår et boost på op til 2,42% i form af Pearson korrelationskoefficienter i modsætning til vaniljetræningsteknikker, når du overvejer CompLex fra Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 datasættet. Samtidig opnår vi en stigning på 3% i Pearson scoringer, mens vi overvejer en tværsproget opsætning baseret på Complex Word Identification 2018 datasættet. Desuden giver vores model state-of-the-art resultater i form af Mean Absolute Error.', 'de': 'Komplexe Wortidentifikation (CWI) ist ein Eckpfeiler für eine korrekte Textvereinfachung. CWI ist stark vom Kontext abhängig, während seine Schwierigkeit durch die Knappheit verfügbarer Datensätze erhöht wird, die stark in Bezug auf Domänen und Sprachen variieren. Daher wird es immer schwieriger, ein robustes Modell zu entwickeln, das sich über eine Vielzahl von Eingabebeispielen verallgemeinert. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neuartige Trainingstechnik für die CWI-Aufgabe vor, die auf Domänenanpassung basiert, um die Zielcharakter- und Kontextdarstellungen zu verbessern. Diese Technik befasst sich mit dem Problem der Arbeit mit mehreren Domänen, da sie eine Möglichkeit schafft, die Unterschiede zwischen den untersuchten Datensätzen zu glätten. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir eine ähnliche Hilfsaufgabe vor, nämlich die Textvereinfachung, die zur Ergänzung der lexikalischen Komplexitätsvorhersage genutzt werden kann. Unser Modell erhält einen Boost von bis zu 2,42% in Bezug auf Pearson Korrelationskoeffizienten im Gegensatz zu Vanilletrainingstechniken, wenn man den CompLex aus dem Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 Datensatz betrachtet. Gleichzeitig erzielen wir eine Erhöhung um 3% der Pearson-Scores, während wir eine sprachübergreifende Einrichtung auf Basis des Datensatzes Complex Word Identification 2018 in Betracht ziehen. Darüber hinaus liefert unser Modell State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse in Bezug auf Mean Absolute Error.', 'fa': 'شناسایی کلمه پیچیده (CWI) یک فرایند سنگ گوشه به سمت ساده\u200cسازی متن درست است. CWI بسیار بستگی به محیط است، در حالی که مشکلات آن به وسیله کمی از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای موجود افزایش می\u200cیابد که بسیار به عنوان مجموعه\u200cها و زبانها تغییر می\u200cدهند. به عنوان این، برای توسعه یک مدل قوی بیشتر سخت\u200cتر می\u200cشود که در یک مجموعه\u200cی مثال وارد می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما یک تکنیک آموزش روانی برای کار CWI پیشنهاد می کنیم که بر اساس تعادل دامنی برای بهتر کردن شخصیت هدف و نمایش محیط هدف باشد. این تکنیک مشکل کار کردن با چندین دامنه را دریافت می\u200cکند، در حالی که راه حل کردن تفاوت بین مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای تحقیق می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، ما همچنین یک کار کمک مشابه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یعنی ساده\u200cسازی متن، که می\u200cتواند برای تعداد پیش\u200cبینی پیچیدگی زبانی استفاده شود. مدل ما تا 2.42 درصد به عنوان تعداد کوتاهی\u200cهای کوتاهی Pearson در مقابل تکنیک آموزش\u200cهای vanilla، در حالی که با توجه به CompLex از پیشنهاد داده\u200cهای تعداد\u200cهای کوتاهی Lexical Complexity 2021 بررسی می\u200cکند. در همین زمان، ما در امتیاز Pearson بیشتر از 3 درصد دریافت می\u200cکنیم، در حالی که با توجه به یک تنظیم متفاوت زبانی که بر پایه شناسایی داده\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای کامل ۲۰۰۸ بستگی دارد. علاوه بر این، مدل ما نتایج موقعیت هنر را به عنوان خطای معنی مطلق می دهد.', 'id': 'Identifikasi kata kompleks (CWI) adalah proses batu sudut menuju simplifikasi teks yang tepat. CWI sangat tergantung pada konteks, sementara kesulitannya ditambah oleh kekurangan dataset yang tersedia yang sangat berbeda dalam terma domain dan bahasa. As such, it becomes increasingly more difficult to develop a robust model that generalizes across a wide array of input examples.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan teknik latihan baru untuk tugas CWI berdasarkan adaptasi domain untuk meningkatkan karakter sasaran dan representation konteks. Teknik ini mengatasi masalah bekerja dengan banyak domain, sebagaimana ia menciptakan cara untuk menyesuaikan perbedaan antara set data yang dikeksplorasi. Selain itu, kami juga mengusulkan tugas bantuan yang sama, yaitu penyimplifikasi teks, yang dapat digunakan untuk mendalam prediksi kompleksitas lexik. Model kami mendapatkan meningkatkan hingga 2,42% dalam terma Pearson Correlation Coefficients dalam perbedaan dengan teknik latihan vanilla, ketika mempertimbangkan CompLex dari dataset Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. Pada saat yang sama, kita mendapatkan peningkatan 3% pada skor Pearson, sementara mempertimbangkan seting saling bahasa bergantung pada set data Identifikasi kata kompleks 2018. Selain itu, model kami memberikan hasil terbaik dalam terma Kesalahan Absolut.', 'ko': '복잡한 단어 인식(CWI)은 적절한 텍스트를 단순화하는 기초 과정이다.CWI는 상하문에 고도로 의존하고 사용 가능한 데이터 집합의 희소성은 그 난이도를 증가시켰으며 이러한 데이터 집합은 영역과 언어의 차이가 매우 크다.따라서 대량의 입력 예시를 요약할 수 있는 건장한 모델을 개발하는 것은 갈수록 어려워지고 있다.본고에서 우리는 분야에 기반한 새로운 CWI 임무 훈련 기술을 제시하여 목표 특징과 상하문 표시를 개선했다.이 기술은 여러 개의 영역을 사용하는 문제를 해결했다. 왜냐하면 이미 탐색한 데이터 집합 사이의 차이를 매끄럽게 하는 방법을 만들었기 때문이다.그 밖에 우리는 유사한 보조 임무, 즉 텍스트를 간소화하면 어휘의 복잡성 예측을 보충할 수 있다.2021년 어휘 복잡도 예측 데이터세트의 복잡성을 고려할 때 우리 모델은 피어슨 상관계수 측면에서 일반 훈련 기술보다 2.42% 높아졌다.또한 우리가 복잡한 단어 식별 2018 데이터 집합에 의존하는 다중 언어 설정을 고려할 때 필슨 점수는 3% 증가했다.그 밖에 우리 모델은 평균 절대 오차 방면에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa neno la komplekx (CWI) ni mchakato wa msingi wa mwanzo kwa urahisi sahihi wa maandishi. CWI inategemea sana muktadha huo, wakati matatizo yake yanaongezeka na ukosefu wa seti za data zinazopatikana zinazotofautiana sana katika masuala ya ndani na lugha. Kwa namna hiyo, inazidi kuwa vigumu kuendeleza muundo wa ubaguzi unaoanzisha mifano mingi ya input. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza teknolojia ya mafunzo ya riwaya kwa kazi ya CWI kwa kutumia mabadiliko ya ndani ili kuboresha tabia na uwakilishi wa mazingira. Kiteknolojia hiki kinazungumzia tatizo la kufanya kazi na maeneo mbalimbali, kwa sababu inatengeneza njia ya kuvuta tofauti kati ya seti za taarifa zilizotafuta. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza kazi inayofanana na ushirikiano, kama urahisi wa maandishi, ambazo zinaweza kutumika ili kutimiza utabiri wa utabiri wa kiukosuko. Mfano wetu unapata ongezeko la kufikia asilimia 2.42 kwa mujibu wa ufanisi wa Mawasiliano ya Pearson tofauti na mbinu za mafunzo yasiyo na maana ya kuangalia CompLex kutoka kwenye seti ya data za Tawala ya Lexico 2021. Wakati huohuo, tunapata ongezeko la asilimia 3 katika vipindi vya Pearson, wakati tunafikiria utaratibu wa lugha inayotegemea utambulisho wa neno la kompyuta mwaka 2018. Zaidi ya hayo, mifano yetu inatoa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa yanayohusu kosa la kiwango kikubwa.', 'af': "Kompleks woord identifikasie (CWI) is 'n hoekenstein proses na regte teks eenvoudiging. CWI is baie afhanklik van konteks, terwyl sy moeilikheid vergroot word deur die skande van beskikbaar datastelle wat groot verskil word in terms van domeine en tale. Soos sodat, word dit vermeerder moeilik om 'n sterk model te ontwikkel wat genereliseer deur 'n wyde skikking van invoer voorbeelde. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n nuwe onderwerp teknik vir die CWI taak gebaseer op domein aanpassing om die doel karakter en konteks voorstellings te verbeter. Hierdie tekniks adreseer die probleem van werk met veelvuldige domeine, omdat dit 'n manier van glans maak die verskille tussen die uitgesoekte datastelle. Ook voorstel ons ook 'n vergelykende hulpbreking, bedoel teks vereenvoudiging, wat kan gebruik word om lexiese kompleksiteit voorskou te voldoen. Ons model kry 'n boonste van up to 2.42% in terms of Pearson Correlation Coefficients in contrast to vanilla training techniques, when considering the CompLex from the Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 dataset. Op dieselfde tyd, kry ons 'n verhoog van 3% in Pearson skaars, terwyl ons 'n kruistale opstelling wat vertrou op die kompleks Woord Identifikasie 2018 datastel. In addition, our model yields state-of-the-art results in terms of Mean Absolute Fout.", 'sq': 'Identifikimi kompleks i fjalës (CWI) është një proces guri qosor drejt thjeshtimit të duhur të tekstit. CWI është shumë i varur nga konteksti, ndërsa vështirësia e tij rritet nga mungesa e të dhënave të disponueshme që ndryshojnë shumë në termat e domeneve dhe gjuhëve. Si e tillë, bëhet gjithnjë e më e vështirë të zhvillohet një model i fortë që gjeneralizohet nëpër një sërë shembuj të gjerë të hyrjes. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një teknikë të re trajnimi për detyrën e CWI bazuar në përshtatjen e domenit për të përmirësuar karakterin objektiv dhe përfaqësimet e kontekstit. Kjo teknikë trajton problemin e punës me shumë fusha, në mënyrë që krijon një mënyrë për të lehtësuar dallimet midis grupeve të dhënash të eksploruara. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë gjithashtu një detyrë ndihmëse të ngjashme, veçanërisht thjeshtimin e tekstit, që mund të përdoret për të komplementuar parashikimin e kompleksitetit lexik. Modeli ynë merr një rritje deri në 2.42% në lidhje me Koeficientët e Korelacionit të Pearsonit në kontrast me teknikat e trajnimit të vanilës, kur konsiderohet Kompleksi nga kompleksiteti Lexical Prediction 2021. Në të njëjtën kohë, ne arrijmë një rritje prej 3% në rezultatet e Pearson, ndërsa konsiderojmë një konfigurim ndërgjuhësor mbështetur në kompleksin e të dhënave për identifikimin e fjalëve 2018. Përveç kësaj, modeli ynë jep rezultate më të larta në termat e gabimit të mesëm absolut.', 'tr': 'Komplik s철z tan캇mlamas캇 (CWI) do휓ru metin basitle힊tirmesine do휓ru bir k철k ta힊 prosesidir. DWI kontekstden 철r채n baglan첵ar, 첵철ne bu kyn챌ylyk 첵erle힊첵채n veri setirlerini흫 azalygyna g철r채 k철p g철rn체힊diril첵채r. 힇onu흫 첵aly, g체첵챌li bir nusgany d체힊체rmek kyn챌yl첵ar. Bu nusgalary흫 d철wletlerinde 체첵tgetmesi kyn챌yl첵ar. Bu kagyzda, biz CWI zady 체챌in bir roman okuw챌y teknikini hedef karakteri we kontekst temsillerini geli힊tirmek 체챌in demokratik adaptasi첵asyna da첵an첵ar. Bu tekniki첵a birn채챌e saha bilen i힊lemek kyn챌ylygyny 챌철z첵채r. 횉체nk체 bu tekniki첵a g철zlenen veri setirlerini흫 arasyndaky tapawutlaryny 첵uwla힊dyr첵ar. Mundan so흫ra, biz hem me흫ze힊 k철mek ta첵ram챌ylygy maslahat ber첵채ris, di첵mek 체챌in metin 첵e흫lemek 체챌in ullan첵ar. Bizi흫 modelimiz Pearson Hakyrtylyk Koefisy첵atlaryny흫 2.42% 첵agda첵ynda 첵okarylyk gazan첵ar, 2021-nji 첵yldan Kompleks Kompleksi첵asyny흫 체st체nde hasaplan첵an teknikleri흫 첵agda첵ynda. 힇ol wagtda, Pearson sanlarynda 3% artdyryl첵ar, 2018-nji 첵yldaky kompleks s철z kimligine baglan첵an bir 챌arpaz dilli d체z체mleri d체힊체n첵채ris. Munu흫 체stine, bizi흫 nusgamyz sungaty흫 durumyny 첵agda첵y Absolut Hata d철redil첵채n netijede getirir.', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ቃላት ማውጫ CWI በሥርዓት ላይ የታመነ ነው፥ ምንም እንኳን ችግር በተለየ ውጤቶች እና ቋንቋዎች በተለየ የዳታ ማዕከላዊ ጥሩ ሲጨመር ነው፡፡ እንደዚህም፣ የሮቦት ሞዴል በመፍጠር ላይ በብዙ ዓይነት የጥያቄ ምሳሌዎችን የሚያሳውቅ ይጨነቃል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የግንኙነቱን አካባቢ እና የግንኙነቱን አካባቢ ለማሻሻል የCWI ስራትን በመሠረት ላይ የመረጃ ትምህርት ትምህርት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህ ቴክክኖክ በብዙ ድሆች ጋር ለመሥራት ጉዳይ ነው፤ ስለዚህም በተመረጠው የዳታ መስመር መካከል ያለውን ልዩነትን በመስመር ይችላል፡፡ Moreover, we also propose a similar auxiliary task, namely text simplification, that can be used to complement lexical complexity prediction.  ሞዴሌክታችን በ2021 ዳታዎችን ከሌክሲካዊ አካላቢ ፕሬክሲካዊ አካባቢ መሆኑን በተቃውሞ የፎቶ ትምህርት ትክክለኛ በሁለት.42 በመቶ ያበረታታል፡፡ በዚያው ሰዓት በ2018 የካውንቲክ ቃላት ማወቃት ላይ የሚደገፍ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ጥናት ሲያሳየን 3 በመቶ ማድረግ እናገኛለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ሞዴላያችን የ-የ-art ሥርዓት አካሄዱን በሚያሳየው የስህተት ውጤት ይሰጣል፡፡', 'hy': 'Բառի բարդ հայտնաբերումը (CWi) անկյունաքարերի գործընթաց է, որպեսզի ճիշտ տեքստի պարզ լինի: CW-ը շատ կախված է կոնտեքստից, մինչդեռ դրա դժվարությունը աճում է հասանելի տվյալների բացակայության պատճառով, որոնք շատ տարբերվում են բնագավառների և լեզուների առումով: Այսպիսով, ավելի ու ավելի դժվար է զարգացնել մի ուժեղ մոդել, որը ընդհանուր է ընդհանուր տեսակի ներմուծման օրինակներ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք CWE-ի հանձնարարության նոր ուսուցման մեթոդ, որը հիմնված է բնագավառի ադապտացիայի վրա, որպեսզի բարելավվի նպատակային կերպարը և կոնտեքստի ներկայացումները: Այս տեխնիկան լուծում է բազմաթիվ բնագավառների հետ աշխատելու խնդիրը, քանի որ այն ստեղծում է միջոց, որը կլուծի ուսումնասիրելի տվյալների համակարգերի տարբերությունները: Ավելին, մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք նման օգնական խնդիր, հատկապես տեքստի պարզաբանությունը, որը կարող է օգտագործվել լեքսիկական բարդության կանխատեսման համար: Մեր մոդելը հասնում է մինչև 2.42 տոկոսի բարձրացումը Փարսոնի կորելացիայի կոեֆեյֆեկտների տեսանկյունից, հակառակ վանիլայի ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներին, երբ հաշվի առնում է Կոմպլեքսը 2021 թվականի լեքսիկական բարդության կանխատեսումների տվյա Միևնույն ժամանակ մենք հասնում ենք Փարսոնի գնահատականների 3 տոկոսով աճ, հաշվի առնելով երկլեզվային կառուցվածքը, որը հիմնված է 2018 թվականի բարդ բառերի ինքնության տվյալների համակարգում: Ավելին, մեր մոդելը բերում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ միջին բացարձակ սխալ տեսանկյունից:', 'bn': 'কমপ্লেক্স শব্দের পরিচয় (সিডিউআই) সঠিক টেক্সট সুস্পষ্ট প্রক্রিয়ার প্রসেস। সিডিউআই প্রেক্ষাপটের উপর অত্যন্ত নির্ভর করে, যদিও বিদ্যমান ডাটাসেটের ভয়াবহতার দ্বারা তার কঠিন বৃদ্ধি পায় যা ডোমেন এবং ভাষার এভাবেই, একটি রোবট মডেল উন্নয়নের জন্য বেশ কঠিন হয়ে যায় যা বিশাল ধরনের ইনপুটের উদাহরণ সৃষ্টি করে। In this paper, we propose a novel training technique for the CWI task based on domain adaptation to improve the target character and context representations.  এই প্রযুক্তিটি বেশ কয়েকটি ডোমেইনের সাথে কাজ করার সমস্যার সাথে কথা বলেছে, যেহেতু এটা বিস্ফোরিত তথ্য সেটের মধ্যে পার্থক্য ধূ এছাড়াও, আমরা একই ধরনের সমর্থক কাজের প্রস্তাব করি, যার মাধ্যমে লেক্সিক্যাল জটিল ভবিষ্যৎ পূর্ণ করতে পারি। আমাদের মডেল লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল কমপ্লেক্সিটি ২০২১ ডাটাসেট থেকে কম্পোলেক্সের বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের প্রযুক্তির বিরুদ্ধে পেয়ার্সন কোর্যান্ডের কার্যক একই সাথে আমরা পিয়ারসন স্কোরে ৩% বৃদ্ধি পেয়েছি, যখন কমপ্লেক্স শব্দ পরিচয় ২০১৮ ডাটাটাসেটে নির্ভর করা একটি ক্রাস্ভাষাভাষী বিষয়বস্তু ব এছাড়াও, আমাদের মডেল মানের পরিপূর্ণ ত্রুটির মাধ্যমে স্টেট-শিল্পের ফলাফল প্রদান করে।', 'az': "Komplex söz tanımlaması (CWI) doğru metin olaraq köçək taş prosesidir. CWI məlumatdan çox bağlıdır, amma onun çətinliklərini məlumatı və dilləri ilə çox dəyişiklik edən məlumat qurmaqlarının zəifliyindən artırar. Bəlkə, çox çətin bir modeli təhsil etmək daha çətin olur ki, böyük bir çox giriş nümunələrində generalizlənir. Bu kağızda, CWI işi üçün yeni təhsil tekniki təklif edirik, məqsəd karakterlərini və məlumatlarını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün domena uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün. Bu teknikə çoxlu domena ilə işləmə problemini çəkir, araşdırılmış verilənlər arasındakı fərqləri düzəltmə yolu yaratdığı üçün. Daha sonra, biz də eyni bir köməkçi işi təklif edirik, mətn basitlaması, ki, leksik kompleksitə tədbirlərini tamamlamaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər. Modelimiz Pearson Correlation Koeficientləri ilə vanilla təhsil metodlarına qarşı 2.42%-dən artırmaq üçün, bu təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təsiri 2021 veri quruluşundan CompLex'i düşündükdə. Aynı zamanda Pearson qiymətlərində 3%-dən artırılır, 2018-ci Complex Word Identification quruluğuna təvəkkül edilən çox dil quruluğunu düşünürək. Əvvəlcə, modellərimiz məlumatın vəziyyətini orta tamamlama xətası ilə verir.", 'ca': "La identificació de paraules complexes (CWI) és un procés de pedra angular cap a una simplificació correcta del text. El CWI depèn molt del context, mentre que la seva dificultat s'augmenta per l'escassetat de conjunts de dades disponibles que varien molt en termes de dominis i llengües. Com a tal, és cada cop més difícil desenvolupar un model robust que s'generalitza a través d'una gran varietat d'exemples d'entrada. En aquest paper, proposem una nova tècnica d'entrenament per a la tasca CWI basada en l'adaptació de dominis per millorar el caràcter d'objectiu i les representacions contextuals. Aquesta tècnica aborda el problem a de treballar amb múltiples dominys, en la medida en que crea una manera de lliurar les diferències entre els conjunts de dades explorats. A més, també proposem una tasca auxiliar similar, a saber, la simplificació del text, que pot ser utilitzada per complementar la predicció de la complexitat lexical. El nostre model obté un impuls de fins al 2,42% en termes de Coeficients de Correlació Pearson en contrast amb tècniques d'entrenament de vanilla, quan considera el CompLex del conjunt de dades de la Predicció de Complexitat Lèxica 2021. Al mateix temps, obtenim un increment del 3% en les puntuacions de Pearson, mentre considerem una configuració translingüística basada en el conjunt de dades d'identificació de paraules complexes 2018. A més, el nostre model produeix resultats més avançats en termes d'error absolut mitjà.", 'bs': 'Kompleksna identifikacija riječi (CWI) je proces uglovnog kamena prema pravom pojednostavljanju teksta. CWI je veoma zavisna od konteksta, dok joj je teškoća povećana nedostatak dostupnih podataka koji se veoma razlikuju u smislu domena i jezika. Kao što je tako, postaje sve teže razviti jak model koji generalizuje široki niz primjera ulaska. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu tehniku obuke za zadatak CWI na temelju adaptacije domena za poboljšanje ciljnog karaktera i konteksta. Ova tehnika rješava problem rada sa višestrukim domenama, jer stvara način da olakša razlike između istraženih dataseta. Osim toga, također predlažemo sličan pomoćni zadatak, a to je pojednostavljanje teksta, koji se može koristiti za dodavanje predviđanja leksičke složenosti. Naš model dobija povećanje do 2,42% u smislu koeficijenta Pearson korelacije u suprotnosti s tehnikama obuke vanile, kad razmotrimo kompleks iz predviđenja za leksičku kompleksnost 2021. U isto vrijeme, dobijemo povećanje od 3% u Pearsonovim rezultatima, dok razmatramo cross-lingual setup koji se oslanja na kompleksnoj identifikaciji riječi 2018. Osim toga, naš model daje rezultate umjetnosti u smislu srednje apsolutne greške.', 'fi': 'Monimutkainen sanatunnistus (CWI) on kulmakivi tekstin asianmukaisessa yksinkertaistamisessa. CWI on hyvin riippuvainen kontekstista, kun taas sen vaikeutta lisää saatavilla olevien tietoaineistojen niukkuus, jotka vaihtelevat suuresti toimialueiden ja kielten suhteen. Näin ollen on yhä vaikeampaa kehittää vankkaa mallia, joka yleistyy monenlaisiin syöttöesimerkkeihin. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta koulutustekniikkaa CWI-tehtävään, joka perustuu verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseen kohdeluonteen ja kontekstin esittämisen parantamiseksi. Tämä tekniikka käsittelee useiden toimialueiden kanssa työskentelyn ongelmaa, sillä se luo tavan tasoittaa tutkittujen aineistojen välisiä eroja. Lisäksi ehdotamme vastaavaa aputehtävää eli tekstin yksinkertaistamista, jota voidaan käyttää täydentämään sanaston monimutkaisuuden ennustamista. Mallimme saa jopa 2,42 prosentin nousun Pearson-korrelaatiokertoimissa verrattuna vaniljakoulutustekniikkaan Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021 -aineiston CompLex-menetelmällä. Samaan aikaan Pearson-pistemäärät nousevat 3%, kun otetaan huomioon monikielinen kokoonpano, joka perustuu Complex Word Identification 2018 -aineistoon. Lisäksi mallimme tuottaa huippuluokan tuloksia keskimääräisen absoluuttisen virheen suhteen.', 'cs': 'Komplexní identifikace slov (CWI) je základním kamenem pro správné zjednodušení textu. CWI je vysoce závislá na kontextu, zatímco její obtížnost je zvýšena nedostatkem dostupných datových souborů, které se značně liší z hlediska domén a jazyků. Proto je stále obtížnější vyvinout robustní model, který zobecňuje širokou škálu vstupních příkladů. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou výcvikovou techniku pro úlohu CWI založenou na adaptaci domény pro zlepšení reprezentace cílového charakteru a kontextu. Tato technika řeší problém práce s více doménami, protože vytváří způsob, jak vyhladit rozdíly mezi zkoumanými datovými sadami. Navíc navrhujeme podobný pomocný úkol, konkrétně zjednodušení textu, který lze použít k doplnění predikce složitosti lexikální. Náš model získává zvýšení až 2,42% z hlediska Pearsonových korelačních koeficientů na rozdíl od vanilkových tréninkových technik při zvažování CompLex z datové sady Lexical Complexity Prediction 2021. Současně získáváme zvýšení o 3% v Pearsonových skórích, přičemž zvažujeme nastavení více jazyků spoléhající na datovou sadu Complex Word Identification 2018. Navíc náš model přináší nejmodernější výsledky z hlediska průměrné absolutní chyby.', 'et': 'Keeruline sõnade identifitseerimine (CWI) on teksti nõuetekohase lihtsustamise nurgakivi. CWI sõltub suuresti kontekstist, samas kui selle raskust suurendab kättesaadavate andmekogumite nappus, mis erinevad suuresti domeenide ja keelte poolest. Sellisena muutub üha raskemaks töötada välja tugev mudel, mis üldistab paljude sisendnäidete hulka. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse CWI ülesande koolitustehnika, mis põhineb domeeni kohandamisel, et parandada sihtiseloomu ja konteksti kujutamist. See tehnika käsitleb mitme domeeniga töötamise probleemi, kuna see loob võimaluse uuritud andmekogumite erinevuste tasandamiseks. Lisaks pakume välja sarnase abiülesande, nimelt teksti lihtsustamise, mida saab kasutada leksikaalse keerukuse prognoosimiseks. Meie mudel suurendab Pearsoni korrelatsioonikoefitsientide osas kuni 2,42% võrra erinevalt vanillikoolitustehnikatest Lexical Complexity Prognition 2021 andmekogumi CompLexi arvestades. Samal ajal suurenevad Pearsoni skoorid 3% võrra, arvestades keeleülest seadistust, mis põhineb kompleksne sõnade identifitseerimise 2018 andmekogumil. Lisaks annab meie mudel tipptasemel tulemusi keskmise absoluutse vea osas.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin maganar Complex (CWI) shi ne wani aikin kwanan aiki zuwa mai daidaita matsayi. @ info Kamar wannan, za ta fi tsanani kwaɗayin ka buɗe wata misãlai mai matsayi wanda ke ƙara cikin wasu misãlai masu cikin tsari. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani takin mai amfani da nowaya wa aikin CWI a kan kwamfyutan adadi da Domen dõmin ya gyara tsarin da ake amfani da shi. Wannan technical yana tambayar a matsalar yin aiki da ke cikin sauran sauti-daban, don haka, kamar shi na sami wani hanyor ya samu-siga tsakanin danne-zane da aka samu. Kayya, za'a goyya wani aikin da ke daidaita, kamar rubutun na rubutu, wanda za'a iya amfani da shi dõmin ya cika bayani ga littafin mai kifi. @ info: status A sami wannan, za'a sami ƙari da 3% cikin scori na Pearson, kuma a sami da kafin-nau'in-nau'i mai tsawo, yana dõgara kan shaidar Kalmar Complex 2018. In addition, our model yields state-of-the-art results in terms of Mean Absolute Error.", 'sk': 'Kompleksna identifikacija besed (CWI) je temeljni proces za ustrezno poenostavitev besedila. CWI je zelo odvisen od konteksta, njegovo težavo pa povečuje pomanjkanje razpoložljivih naborov podatkov, ki se zelo razlikujejo glede domen in jezikov. Kot tako postaja vse težje razviti robustni model, ki se posplošuje v širokem naboru vhodnih primerov. V prispevku predlagamo novo tehniko usposabljanja za nalogo CWI, ki temelji na domenski prilagoditvi za izboljšanje predstavitve ciljnega značaja in konteksta. Ta tehnika obravnava problem dela z več domenami, saj ustvarja način za zmanjšanje razlik med raziskanimi nabori podatkov. Poleg tega predlagamo tudi podobno pomožno nalogo, namreč poenostavitev besedila, ki jo lahko uporabimo za dopolnitev napovedi leksikalne kompleksnosti. Naš model pridobi do 2,42% povečanje Pearsonovih korelacijskih koeficientov v nasprotju s tehnikami vadbe vanilije, ko upoštevamo CompLex iz nabora podatkov Lexical Complexity Napoved 2021. Hkrati pridobimo 3-odstotno povečanje Pearsonovih rezultatov, pri čemer upoštevamo medjezično nastavitev, ki temelji na naboru podatkov kompleksne identifikacije besed 2018. Poleg tega naš model prinaša najsodobnejše rezultate v smislu povprečne absolutne napake.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink CWI luwih akeh mengkar ditambah ning kontext, sampeyan ngono kalunggkar nggawe barang langgar oleh operasi dadi sing ditambah akeh dhéwé Kaya ngono, lak akeh luwih akeh jajal kanggo nguasai model sing gawe nguasai kapan mulalah sing katok barang input. In this paper, we proposal a rome Learning Method for the CWI task supported on domain modification to advance the goal character and context representations. Genjer-teknik iki dadi kapan kanggo nyulung gambaran karo siji dadi sing sampeyan politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness model dhéwé iso nglanggar ndherengé 2.34% uwong kelas telas nggambar kelas 2.34% kuwi ngregani soko kuchilian sing paling maneh, kuwi mau sawetara CompLex nambah dhéwé bakal terus marilah Nambah bertan, kita lagi butuh 3% nang sampek perberson dumaten, uga njaluk nyong langgar-langgar setup sing nyong nggawe datha-setup kompleh Nambah, modelo nambah dadi durum-sampeyan-sampeyan kuwi duluran kanggo ngerasakno sing perusahaan juara sing dikarepaké Waktu.', 'he': 'Complex word identification (CWI) is a cornerstone process towards proper text simplification.  CWI תלוי במיוחד בקשר, בעוד הקשה שלה מוגדל על ידי חסר קבוצות נתונים זמינות ששונות מאוד במונחים של שפות ושדות. ככה, זה נהיה יותר ויותר קשה לפתח דוגמא חזקה שמתפתחת במערכת רחבה של דוגמאות כניסה. In this paper, we propose a novel training technique for the CWI task based on domain adaptation to improve the target character and context representations.  הטכניקה הזאת מתייחסת לבעיה של העבודה עם תרומות רבות, במידה שהיא יוצרת דרך להחליק את ההבדלים בין קבוצות הנתונים המחקרים. חוץ מזה, אנחנו גם מציעים משימה עזרית דומה, כלומר הפשטות טקסט, שיכולה להשתמש בהחלטה בחזוי מורכבות לקסית. המודל שלנו מקבל דחיפה של עד 2.42% במונחים של שיעורי הקשר של פירסון בניגוד לטכניקות אימונים בוניליה, כששוקלים את הקומפלקס ממערכת נתונים של תקיפת הקסמית 2021. באותו הזמן, אנו מקבלים עלייה של 3% בתוצאות פירסון, בזמן ששוקלים התקנה דרך שפתיים מסתמכת על קבוצת מילים מורכבת מזהה 2018. בנוסף, המודל שלנו מוביל תוצאות חדשות במונחים של טעות מוחלטת אמצעית.', 'bo': 'Complex word identification (CWI) is a cornerstone process towards proper text simplification. CWI དེ་ནི་ཁོར་ཡུག་དང་འབྲེལ་རྟེན་ཏུ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། དཔེར་ན། འུ་ཅག་གི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཆེ་བའི་སྣང་རྩལ་བ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ནས། In this paper, we propose a novel training technique for the CWI task based on domain adaptation to improve the target character and context representations. དངོས་འབྲེལ་འདིས་explored གནད་སྡུད་ཚང་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ལས་ཀ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡོད། ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་བཟུང་བའི་ལས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྤྲོད་ཚུལ་བྱ་རིམ་ཞིག་རྟོགས་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་ཉེན་ཁ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་Pearson ཡི་གྲངས་ཀ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་གཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་3% དར་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་མིག་སྔར་སྟོན་པར་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བརྗོད་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Improving Meta-learning for Low-resource Text Classification and Generation via Memory Imitation', 'es': 'JointCL: un marco conjunto de aprendizaje contrastivo para la detección de posturas de tiro cero', 'fr': "JointCL\xa0: Un cadre d'apprentissage contrastif conjoint pour la détection de position zéro tir", 'ar': 'JointCL: إطار عمل تعليمي متباين مشترك لاكتشاف الموقف الصفري', 'pt': 'JointCL: Uma Estrutura Conjunta de Aprendizagem Contrastiva para Detecção de Postura Zero-Shot', 'ja': 'JointCL ：ゼロショットスタンス検出のための共同コントラスト学習フレームワーク', 'hi': 'JointCL: शून्य-शॉट रुख का पता लगाने के लिए एक संयुक्त Contrastive लर्निंग फ्रेमवर्क', 'zh': 'JointCL:以零射比学框架', 'ru': 'JointCL: Совместная рамочная программа контрастного обучения для определения положения без выстрела', 'ga': 'JointCL: Comhchreat Foghlama Codarsnachta le haghaidh Braite Seasaimh Zero-shot', 'ka': 'JointCL', 'el': 'Ένα κοινό αντιφατικό μαθησιακό πλαίσιο για ανίχνευση στάσεων μηδενικού πυροβολισμού', 'hu': 'JointCL: Egy k철z철s kontraszt챠v tanul찼si keretrendszer a z챕r처 l철v챕ses helyzet felismer챕s챕hez', 'it': 'JointCL: un framework di apprendimento contrastante congiunto per il rilevamento della posizione zero-shot', 'mk': 'JointCL: Заедничка контрастивна рамка за учење за детективирање на станици без пукање', 'kk': 'JointCL: Zero-Shot Stance анықтау үшін біріктірілген контрастық оқу фреймі', 'lt': 'JointCL: Bendra prieštaringo mokymosi sistema, skirta nenustatytoms vietos nustatymui', 'ms': 'JointCL: Sebuah Bingkai Belajar Kontrastif Berkongsi untuk Pengesanan Stensi Semula-Tembak', 'mt': 'JointCL: Qafas Konġunt ta’ Tagħlim Kontrastiv għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Stanza Żro-Shot', 'ml': '啻氞祰啻班祶鈥嵿磿嗟嵿磿嗟佮磿', 'mn': 'JointCL', 'no': 'JointCL: Eit samanlig kontrastiv læringsrammeverk for null-Shot-Stance-oppdaging', 'pl': 'JointCL: Wspólne ramy kontrastywnego uczenia się dla wykrywania stanu zerowego', 'ro': 'JointCL: Un cadru comun de învățare contrastivă pentru detectarea stării zero-shot', 'sr': 'JointCL: Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ CL: සීරෝ වෙඩි ස්ථානය හොයාගන්න සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමයක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'sv': 'JointCL: En gemensam kontrastiv inlärningsram för detektering av nollskottsställning', 'ta': 'சேர்', 'ur': 'JointCL: A Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Phim Hợp chủng để phát hiện trạng thái chuẩn bị', 'bg': 'Съвместна рамка за контрастивно учене за откриване на позиция без изстрел', 'da': 'JointCL: En fælles kontrastiv læringsramme for detektion af nulskud stance', 'nl': 'JointCL: Een gezamenlijk Contrastive Learning Framework voor Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'hr': 'JointCL: Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'id': 'JointCL: Sebuah Ruang Belajar Kontrastif Berkongsi untuk Deteksi Stasiun Zero-Shot', 'ko': 'JointCL: 0박자 자세 측정을 위한 공동 대비 학습 프레임워크', 'fa': 'JointCL', 'de': 'JointCL: Ein gemeinsames kontrastives Lernframework für die Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'sw': 'Joint CL: Mfumo wa Kufundisha Msingira wa pamoja wa Kugundua Usimamo wa Kupigwa risasi Zero', 'tr': 'Otomatik Saýlaw', 'af': 'JointCL: 芒聙聶n Gesamelende kontrastiewe leer Raamwerk vir Zero- Shot Stance Deteksie', 'sq': 'JointCL: Një kuadër i përbashkët i mësimit kontrastiv për zbulimin e qëndrimit zero-shot', 'am': 'CL: A Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'hy': 'Join C. Միացյալ հակադրական ուսումնասիրության շրջանակը զրո-կրակի կայանների հայտնաբերման համար', 'az': 'JointCL', 'bs': 'JointCL: Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'ca': 'JointCL: A Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'bn': 'যোগ দিন: জিরো- শুট স্টেন্স সনাক্তির জন্য একটি যুক্ত কন্ট্রেসিটিভ শিক্ষা ফ্রেমার্ক', 'cs': 'JointCL: Společný kontrastivní učební rámec pro detekci nulového výstřelu', 'et': 'JointCL: ühine kontrastiivne õpperaamistik nullpatke seisundi tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'JointCL: Yhteinen kontrastiivinen oppimiskehys nollahaun asennon havaitsemiseen', 'jv': 'JointCL', 'he': 'JointCL: מסגרת לימוד נוגדת משותפת לגילוי מצב אפס-יריות', 'sk': 'JointCL: Skupni kontrastni učni okvir za zaznavanje stanja brez strela', 'bo': 'JointCL:Joint Contrastive Learning Framework for Zero-Shot Stance Detection', 'ha': 'CL: A Join Contrastive Learnin Frameworks for Zero- shot Stance'}
{'en': 'Building models of natural language processing (NLP) is challenging in low-resource scenarios where limited data are available. Optimization-based meta-learning algorithms achieve promising results in low-resource scenarios by adapting a well-generalized model initialization to handle new tasks. Nonetheless, these approaches suffer from the memorization overfitting issue, where the model tends to memorize the meta-training tasks while ignoring support sets when adapting to new tasks. To address this issue, we propose a memory imitation meta-learning (MemIML) method that enhances the model’s reliance on support sets for task adaptation. Specifically, we introduce a task-specific memory module to store support set information and construct an imitation module to force query sets to imitate the behaviors of support sets stored in the memory. A theoretical analysis is provided to prove the effectiveness of our method, and empirical results also demonstrate that our method outperforms competitive baselines on both text classification and generation tasks.', 'ar': 'يهدف اكتشاف الموقف بدون طلقة (ZSSD) إلى اكتشاف الموقف لهدف غير مرئي أثناء مرحلة الاستدلال. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا تعليميًا تباينًا مشتركًا (JointCL) ، والذي يتكون من التعلم التباين الموقف والتعلم التباين النموذجي للرسم البياني المدرك للهدف. على وجه التحديد ، يتم استخدام استراتيجية التعلم التباين المواقف لتعميم ميزات الموقف بشكل أفضل للأهداف غير المرئية. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم ببناء رسم بياني نموذجي لكل حالة لمعرفة التمثيل القائم على الهدف ، حيث يتم نشر النماذج الأولية كجسر لمشاركة هياكل الرسم البياني بين الأهداف المعروفة والأهداف غير المرئية. ثم يتم وضع إستراتيجية تعلم تباين نموذجية جديدة مدركة للهدف لتعميم القدرة المنطقية لتمثيلات الموقف المستندة إلى الأهداف على الأهداف غير المرئية. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات معيارية أن النهج المقترح يحقق أداءً متطورًا في مهمة ZSSD.', 'pt': 'A detecção de postura de tiro zero (ZSSD) visa detectar a postura de um alvo invisível durante o estágio de inferência. Neste artigo, propomos uma estrutura de aprendizado contrastivo conjunto (JointCL), que consiste em aprendizado contrastivo de postura e aprendizado contrastivo de grafo prototípico com reconhecimento de alvo. Especificamente, uma estratégia de aprendizagem contrastiva de postura é empregada para generalizar melhor as características de postura para alvos invisíveis. Além disso, construímos um gráfico prototípico para cada instância para aprender a representação baseada em alvos, na qual os protótipos são implantados como uma ponte para compartilhar as estruturas gráficas entre os alvos conhecidos e os não vistos. Em seguida, uma nova estratégia de aprendizagem contrastiva de grafos prototípicos ciente de alvos é desenvolvida para generalizar a capacidade de raciocínio de representações de postura baseadas em alvos para os alvos invisíveis. Extensos experimentos em três conjuntos de dados de referência mostram que a abordagem proposta alcança desempenho de última geração na tarefa ZSSD.', 'fr': "La détection de position de tir zéro (ZSSD) vise à détecter la position d'une cible invisible pendant la phase d'inférence. Dans cet article, nous proposons un cadre d'apprentissage contrastif conjoint (JointCL), qui consiste en un apprentissage contrastif de position et un apprentissage contrastif de graphe prototypique sensible à la cible. Plus précisément, une stratégie d'apprentissage par contraste de position est utilisée pour mieux généraliser les caractéristiques de posture pour des cibles invisibles. De plus, nous construisons un graphe prototype pour chaque instance afin d'apprendre la représentation basée sur la cible, dans laquelle les prototypes sont déployés en tant que pont pour partager les structures de graphes entre les cibles connues et les cibles invisibles. Ensuite, une nouvelle stratégie d'apprentissage contrastif de graphe prototypique sensible à la cible est conçue pour généraliser la capacité de raisonnement des représentations de position basées sur des cibles aux cibles invisibles. Des expériences approfondies sur trois ensembles de données de référence montrent que l'approche proposée permet d'atteindre des performances de pointe dans la tâche ZSSD.", 'es': 'La detección de postura de tiro cero (ZSSD) tiene como objetivo detectar la postura de un objetivo invisible durante la etapa de inferencia. En este artículo, proponemos un marco de aprendizaje contrastivo conjunto (JointCL), que consiste en el aprendizaje contrastivo de postura y el aprendizaje contrastivo de gráficos prototípico consciente de objetivos. Específicamente, se emplea una estrategia de aprendizaje de postura contrastiva para generalizar mejor las características de postura para objetivos invisibles. Además, creamos un gráfico prototípico para cada instancia para aprender la representación basada en objetivos, en la que los prototipos se despliegan como un puente para compartir las estructuras gráficas entre los objetivos conocidos y los que no se ven. Luego, se diseña una novedosa estrategia de aprendizaje contrastante de gráficos prototípicos y consciente de objetivos para generalizar la capacidad de razonamiento de las representaciones de postura basadas en objetivos a los objetivos invisibles. Experimentos exhaustivos en tres conjuntos de datos de referencia muestran que el enfoque propuesto logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en la tarea de ZSSD.', 'ja': 'ゼロショットスタンス検出（ ZSSD ）は、推論段階で見えないターゲットのスタンスを検出することを目的としています。本稿では，スタンスの対照的な学習とターゲットを意識したプロトタイプグラフの対照的な学習からなる合同対照学習（ JointCL ）フレームワークを提案する．具体的には、見えないターゲットのためのスタンス機能をより一般化するために、スタンス対照的な学習戦略が採用される。さらに、ターゲットベースの表現を学習するために、各インスタンスのプロトタイプグラフを作成します。プロトタイプは、既知のターゲットと見えないターゲットとの間のグラフ構造を共有するためのブリッジとして展開されます。次に、ターゲットベースのスタンス表現の推論能力を目に見えないターゲットに一般化するために、新規のターゲット認識プロトタイプグラフ対照学習戦略が考案される。3つのベンチマークデータセットに関する広範な実験は、提案されたアプローチがZSSDタスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成することを示しています。', 'zh': '零射姿势检测(ZSSD)指检测推理阶段不见的姿势。 本文,我们发出一个合对学习(JointCL)框架,该框架由立场对比学习和感知原型图对比学习。 势者,所以比学习策略而举不见也。 又每事构一原型图,以学为文,其中国为桥梁,以共享图构。 然后设新知原型图比学习策略,推原于不见。 3准数集之广实验,所陈之法,ZSSD成先进之性。', 'hi': 'शून्य-शॉट रुख का पता लगाना (ZSSD) का उद्देश्य अनुमान चरण के दौरान एक अनदेखी लक्ष्य के लिए रुख का पता लगाना है। इस पेपर में, हम एक संयुक्त कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग (जॉइंटसीएल) फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें रुख कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग और लक्ष्य-जागरूक प्रोटोटाइपिकल ग्राफ कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग शामिल हैं। विशेष रूप से, एक रुख contrastive सीखने की रणनीति अनदेखी लक्ष्यों के लिए रुख सुविधाओं को बेहतर सामान्यीकृत करने के लिए नियोजित है। इसके अलावा, हम लक्ष्य-आधारित प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए प्रत्येक उदाहरण के लिए एक प्रोटोटाइपिकल ग्राफ का निर्माण करते हैं, जिसमें प्रोटोटाइप को ज्ञात लक्ष्यों और अनदेखी लोगों के बीच ग्राफ संरचनाओं को साझा करने के लिए एक पुल के रूप में तैनात किया जाता है। फिर एक उपन्यास लक्ष्य-जागरूक प्रोटोटाइपिकल ग्राफ कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग रणनीति को अनदेखे लक्ष्यों के लिए लक्ष्य-आधारित रुख प्रतिनिधित्व की तर्क क्षमता को सामान्य बनाने के लिए तैयार किया जाता है। तीन बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण ZSSD कार्य में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение положения нулевого выстрела (ZSSD) направлено на обнаружение положения невидимой цели на этапе вывода. В этой статье мы предлагаем совместную структуру контрастного обучения (JointCL), которая состоит из позиционного контрастного обучения и целеустремленного прототипического графового контрастного обучения. В частности, для лучшего обобщения особенностей позиции для невидимых целей используется стратегия позиционного контрастного обучения. Далее мы строим прототипный граф для каждого экземпляра, чтобы узнать представление на основе цели, в котором прототипы развертываются в качестве моста для совместного использования структур графа между известными целями и невидимыми. Затем разрабатывается новая прототипическая стратегия обучения контрастному графу с учетом цели, чтобы обобщить способность мышления представлений положения на основе цели к невидимым целям. Широкие эксперименты с тремя базовыми наборами данных показывают, что предлагаемый подход позволяет добиться самых современных результатов в решении задачи ZSSD.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag brath neamh-urchair (ZSSD) an seasamh do sprioc nach bhfeictear a bhrath le linn chéim na tátail. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid comhchreat foghlama codarsnachta (JointCL), a chuimsíonn foghlaim sheasaimh chodarsnachta agus foghlaim chodarsnachta ghraif fhréamhshaothair atá feasach ar an sprioc. Go sonrach, úsáidtear straitéis foghlama seasaimh-chodarsnachta chun gnéithe seasaimh do spriocanna nach bhfeictear a ghinearálú níos fearr. Ina theannta sin, tógaimid graf fréamhshamhla le haghaidh gach cás chun an léiriú sprioc-bhunaithe a fhoghlaim, ina n-úsáidtear na fréamhshamhlacha mar dhroichead chun na struchtúir ghraif a roinnt idir na spriocanna aitheanta agus na cinn nach bhfacthas riamh cheana. Ansin, ceaptar straitéis foghlama codarsnachta fréamhshaothair fréamhshaothair úrnua atá feasach ar an sprioc chun cumas réasúnaíochta na léiriú bunaithe ar spriocanna a ghinearálú do na spriocanna nach bhfuil feicthe. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar thrí thacar sonraí tagarmhairc go mbaineann an cur chuige atá beartaithe feidhmíocht úrscothach amach sa tasc ZSSD.', 'ka': 'Zero-სტატის სტანციის განახლება (ZSSD) მიზეზიან განახლება სტანციას, რომელიც ინფრენციის ცენტაციის განახლებაში არაჩვენებული მიზეზი. ამ წიგნიში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ერთადერთი კონტრასტური სწავლების (JointCL) პარამეტრი, რომელიც კონტრასტური კონტრასტური სწავლების და მისაღების პროტიპური გრაფიკის კონტრა განსაკუთრებით, კონტრასტიური სწავლების სტრატიგია უფრო უფრო უფრო გენერალური სტრანტიური ფუნქციებისთვის, რომლებიც არაჩვენებული მიზეზ დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პროტოტიპური გრაფიკი ყოველ ინსტაციისთვის, რომ ვისწავლოთ მიხედვილი რესპეცენტაციას, რომელიც პროტოტიპები გამოყენებულიან როგორც ბრძანი, რომ გრაფიკის სტრ შემდეგ პროტოტიპური პროტიპური გრაფიკური კონტრატიგური სწავლების სტრატიგია დააყენებულია, რომელიც მიხედვის სტრატიფიკური სტრატიფიკური სტრატიფიკური სტრატიფიკური ს უფრო დიდი ექსპერიმენტები სამი ბანქმერის მონაცემების დანაცემებით გამოიყენება, რომ პროგრამების მიღწევა სახელსაწყისი გავაკეთება ZSSD დავალებში.', 'hu': 'ZSSD (ZSSD) célja, hogy felismerje a láthatatlan célpont állását a következtetési szakaszban. Ebben a tanulmányban egy közös kontrasztív tanulási (JointCL) keretrendszert javasolunk, amely álláspont kontrasztív tanulásból és céltudatos prototípus grafikon kontrasztív tanulásból áll. Konkrétan egy álláspont kontrasztos tanulási stratégiát alkalmaznak, hogy jobban általánosítsák az álláspont jellemzőit a láthatatlan célok esetében. Továbbá minden példányhoz prototípusos grafikont készítünk, hogy megismerjük a cél alapú ábrázolást, amelyben a prototípusok hídként vannak telepítve, hogy megosszák a gráf struktúrákat az ismert célpontok és a láthatatlanok között. Ezután új céltudatos prototípusú gráf kontrasztos tanulási stratégiát dolgozunk ki, amely általánosítja a célalapú álláspont reprezentációk érvelési képességét a láthatatlan célokra. Három referenciaadatkészleten végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés korszerű teljesítményt ér el a ZSSD feladatban.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση στάσεων μηδενικού πυροβολισμού στοχεύει στην ανίχνευση της στάσης για έναν αόρατο στόχο κατά τη διάρκεια του σταδίου συμπερασμάτων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα κοινό πλαίσιο αντιθετικής μάθησης (το οποίο αποτελείται από την αντιθετική μάθηση στάσης και την πρωτοτυπική διαγραφική μάθηση με επίγνωση στόχων. Συγκεκριμένα, χρησιμοποιείται μια στρατηγική μάθησης αντίθετης στάσης για την καλύτερη γενικοποίηση των χαρακτηριστικών στάσης για τους αόρατους στόχους. Επιπλέον, κατασκευάζουμε ένα πρωτότυπο γράφημα για κάθε περίπτωση για να μάθουμε την αναπαράσταση με βάση το στόχο, στην οποία τα πρωτότυπα αναπτύσσονται ως γέφυρα για να μοιραστούν τις δομές γραφήματος μεταξύ των γνωστών και των αόρατων στόχων. Στη συνέχεια, σχεδιάζεται μια νέα πρωτοτυπική στρατηγική εκμάθησης διαγραμμάτων για να γενικεύσει την ικανότητα συλλογισμού των αναπαραστάσεων στάσεων βάσει στόχων στους αόρατους στόχους. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στην εργασία ZSSD.', 'it': "Il rilevamento della posizione zero-shot (ZSSD) mira a rilevare la posizione di un bersaglio invisibile durante la fase di inferenza. In questo articolo, proponiamo un framework congiunto di apprendimento contrastante (JointCL), che consiste nell'apprendimento contrastante delle posizioni e nell'apprendimento contrastante dei grafici prototipi target-aware. Nello specifico, viene utilizzata una strategia di apprendimento contrastante per generalizzare meglio le caratteristiche di orientamento per obiettivi invisibili. Inoltre, costruiamo un grafico prototipale per ogni istanza per imparare la rappresentazione basata sul target, in cui i prototipi vengono dispiegati come ponte per condividere le strutture del grafico tra gli obiettivi conosciuti e quelli invisibili. Poi viene ideata una nuova strategia di apprendimento contrastante del grafico prototipale consapevole del target per generalizzare la capacità di ragionamento delle rappresentazioni di posizione basate sul target ai target invisibili. Esperimenti approfonditi su tre set di dati benchmark mostrano che l'approccio proposto raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia nel compito ZSSD.", 'kk': 'Нөл- сүрттерді анықтау (ZSSD) кезінде көрінбеген мақсатты анықтау үшін мақсатты. Бұл қағазда біз жалпы контрастырлық оқыту (JointCL) қоршауын ұсынамыз. Бұл контрастырлық оқыту мен мақсатталған прототипиялық графикалық контрастырлық оқыту үшін болады. Ескерту үшін, контрастырлық оқыту стратегиясы көрсетілмеген мақсаттардың жалпы қасиеттерін жақсы түрлендіру үшін қолданылады. Келесіден қатар, біз әрбір данасы мақсатты негізделген таңбашаны үйрену үшін прототипті график құрылып, онда прототиптер білген мақсаттар мен белгілмегендер арасындағы график құрылғыларды бөліктеу үшін көп Содан кейін романдық мақсатты көрінетін прототипикалық график контрастырлық оқыту стратегиясы, мақсатты тапсырмаларды көрінетін мақсаттарға түсініктеме мүмкіндігін жалпы түрлендіру үші Үш бағдарламалар деректер қорларындағы кеңейтілген тәжірибелер ZSSD тапсырмасының күй- жайымдық жұмысын жеткізеді дегенді көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Nustatant nulinę padėtį (ZSSD) siekiama nustatyti nenumatyto tikslo padėtį išvados etape. Šiame dokumente siūlome bendrą kontrastinio mokymosi sistemą (JointCL), kurią sudaro kontrastinis mokymasis ir tiksliniu prototipiniu grafiniu kontrastiniu mokymusi. Konkrečiai, siekiant geriau bendrinti požiūrio ypatumus nenumatytiems tikslams, naudojama kontrastinė mokymosi strategija. Be to, kiekvienam atvejui sukuriame prototipinį grafiką, kad išsiaiškintume tiksliniu būdu pagrįstą atstovavimą, kuriame prototipai naudojami kaip tiltas, kad grafikos struktūros būtų dalijamos tarp žinomų ir nematomų tikslų. Tuomet rengiama nauja prototipinės grafikos kontrastinio mokymosi strategija, kuria siekiama bendro tiksliniu požiūriu pagrįstų atstovavimų pagrįstumo ir nenumatytų tikslų. Išsamūs trijų lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas užtikrina pažangiausius ZSSD užduoties rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на позициите со нула стрела (ZSSD) има за цел да го детектира позицијата на невидлива мета за време на фазата на конференција. Во овој документ, предложуваме заедничка рамка за контрастивно учење (JointCL), која се состои од контрастивно учење на ставот и прототипичко учење на графот со цел. Специфично, за подобро генерализирање на карактеристиките на ставот за невидливи цели се користи стратегија за контрастивно учење. Further, we build a prototypical graph for each instance to learn the target-based representation, in which the prototypes are deployed as a bridge to share the graph structures between the known targets and the unseen ones.  Потоа се подготвува нова прототипична стратегија за контрастивно учење на графикот со цел да се генерализира размислувачката способност на претставувањата на ставот со цел до невидливите цели. Експериментите на три бази на податоци покажуваат дека предложениот пристап постигнува најсовремени резултати во задачата на ЗСД.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan kedudukan 0-shot (ZSSD) bermaksud mengesan kedudukan untuk sasaran yang tidak terlihat semasa tahap kesimpulan. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka pembelajaran kontras (JointCL) bersama, yang terdiri dari pembelajaran kontras kedudukan dan pembelajaran kontras graf prototipik yang sedar sasaran. Specifically, a stance contrastive learning strategy is employed to better generalize stance features for unseen targets.  Selain itu, kita membina graf prototipik untuk setiap contoh untuk belajar perwakilan berasaskan sasaran, di mana prototip digunakan sebagai jembatan untuk berkongsi struktur graf antara sasaran yang diketahui dan yang tidak terlihat. Kemudian strategi pembelajaran bertentangan graf prototipik yang sedar-sasaran baru dicipta untuk menyeluruhkan kemampuan alasan perwakilan kedudukan berdasarkan sasaran kepada sasaran yang tidak terlihat. Eksperimen luas pada tiga set data tanda rujukan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang diusulkan mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art dalam tugas ZSSD.', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-pożizzjoni ta’ żero-shot (ZSSD) għandha l-għan li tidentifika l-pożizzjoni għal mira mhux osservata matul l-istadju tal-inferenza. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas konġunt ta’ tagħlim kuntrastiv (JointCL), li jikkonsisti f’tagħlim kuntrastiv ta’ pożizzjoni u tagħlim kuntrastiv ta’ grafika prototipika konxja mill-mira. B’mod speċifiku, qed tintuża strateġija ta’ tagħlim kuntrastiv ta’ pożizzjoni biex jiġu ġeneralizzati a ħjar il-karatteristiċi ta’ pożizzjoni għal miri mhux osservati. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nibnu graff prototipiku għal kull każ biex nitgħallmu r-rappreżentanza bbażata fuq il-mira, li fiha l-prototipi jintużaw bħala pont biex jaqsmu l-istrutturi tal-graff bejn il-miri magħrufa u dawk li ma jidhrux. Then a novel target-aware prototypical graph contrastive learning strategy is devised to generalize the reasoning ability of target-based stance representations to the unseen targets.  Esperimenti estensivi fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li l-approċċ propost jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata fil-kompitu ZSSD.', 'mn': 'Нэг шалтгаан байдлыг олох (ZSSD) нь халдварын үед харагдахгүй зорилготой байдлыг олж мэдэх зорилго юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хамтдаа эсрэг суралцах (JointCL) суралцах хэлбэрээр санал болгож байна. Энэ нь эсрэг суралцах болон зорилготой прототипик график эсрэг суралцах үйл явц юм. Тодорхой хэлбэл, харьцангуй суралцах стратеги нь харагдахгүй зорилготнуудын тулд илүү ерөнхийлөгчийн байр суралцах чадварыг ашигладаг. Дараа нь, бид нэг жишээ болгон зорилготой загварыг сурахын тулд прототип график бий болгож, тэнд прототип нь мэдэгдэхгүй загваруудын хоорондох график бүтцийг хуваалцах загвар болон харагдахгүй загваруудын хоорондох заг Дараа нь шинэ зорилготой ойлголтын прототипик график харьцангуй суралцах стратеги нь зорилготой байдал дээр харагдаагүй зорилготой зорилготуудыг илэрхийлэх боломжтой болгодог. Гурван багш өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтуудын өргөн туршилтууд ZSSD-ын ажил дээрх урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്ഥാനം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുവാനുള്ള (ZSSD) അപകടത്തിനുള്ള സമയത്ത് ഒരു ഒളിഞ്ഞ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിനുള്ള സ്ഥിത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു യൂട്ട് വിരോധമുള്ള പഠനത്തിന്\u200dറെ (ജോയിന്\u200dസിഎല്\u200d) ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വിദ്യാഭ്യാസ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ വിരോധമായ പദ്ധതിയുടെ ക്രൂരത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d  അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d എല്ലാ ഉദാഹരണത്തിനും ഒരു പ്രോട്ടോട്ടോപ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യം അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d, അത പിന്നീട് ലക്ഷ്യം അറിയുന്ന ഒരു പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിക്കല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാജ്യം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനത്ത മൂന്നു ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രോഗ്', 'no': 'Oppdaging av nullsattestasjon (ZSSD) måtar å oppdaga stasjonen for eit ukjent mål under infeksjonsgrensen. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit samt kontrastlæring (JointCL) rammeverk, som inneheld av kontrastlæring i stasjon og målæring av prototipisk kontrastlæring i grafen. Spesielt er ein kontrastiv læringsstrategi i stasjonen arbeidt for å bedre generellisere stasjonsfunksjonar for ugjennomsiktige mål. I tillegg bygger vi eit prototypisk graf for kvar eksempel for å lære målbasert representasjon, der prototypane vert utførte som ein bridge for å dele grafsstrukturene mellom dei kjente målene og dei ukjende målene. Så er eit prototypisk målæringsstrategi for å generellisera rasjonsbehandlingane for målbaserte stasjonsrepresentasjonar til dei ukjende målene. Utvida eksperimenter på tre benchmarkdatasett viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga når det gjeld kjøringstilstanden i ZSSD-oppgåva.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie pozycji zerowych (ZSSD) ma na celu wykrycie pozycji dla niewidzialnego celu podczas etapu wnioskowania. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wspólne ramy uczenia się kontrastywnego (JointCL), które składają się z uczenia kontrastywnego stanowiska i prototypowego uczenia się kontrastywnego na wykresie. W szczególności stosuje się strategię uczenia się kontrastywnej postawy, aby lepiej uogólnić cechy postawy dla niewidzialnych celów. Ponadto budujemy prototypowy wykres dla każdej instancji, aby nauczyć się reprezentacji opartej na celu, w której prototypy są wdrażane jako most do dzielenia się strukturami wykresu między znanymi i niewidzialnymi celami. Następnie opracowana jest nowa strategia kontrastywnego uczenia się docelowego prototypowego grafu, aby uogólnić zdolność rozumowania reprezentacji postaw opartych na celu do niewidzialnych celów. Obszerne eksperymenty na trzech zestawach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że proponowane podejście osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność w zadaniu ZSSD.', 'ro': 'Detectarea poziției zero-shot (ZSSD) vizează detectarea poziției unei ținte nevăzute în timpul etapei inferenței. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru comun de învățare contrastantă (JointCL), care constă în învățare contrastantă de poziție și învățare contrastantă prototipă grafică. Mai exact, o strategie de învățare contrastantă a poziției este folosită pentru a generaliza mai bine caracteristicile poziției pentru țintele nevăzute. Mai mult, construim un grafic prototip pentru fiecare instanță pentru a învăța reprezentarea bazată pe țintă, în care prototipurile sunt implementate ca o punte pentru a partaja structurile grafice între țintele cunoscute și cele nevăzute. Apoi, o nouă strategie de învățare contrastivă a graficului prototip conștient de țintă este concepută pentru a generaliza capacitatea de raționament a reprezentărilor poziției bazate pe țintă la țintele nevăzute. Experimente ample pe trei seturi de date de referință arată că abordarea propusă obține performanțe de ultimă generație în sarcina ZSSD.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje stanja nuklearnog pogodaka (ZSSD) je cilj da otkrije stanje nevidljivog meta tokom faze infekcije. U ovom papiru predlažemo zajednički okvir kontrastivnog učenja (JointCL), koji se sastoji od kontrastivnog učenja stanja i prototipičnog učenja grafika kontrastivnog znanja cilja. Posebno, strategija kontrastivnog učenja stanja je zaposlena za bolju generalizaciju karakteristika stanja za nevidljive ciljeve. Nadalje, izgradimo prototipski grafik za svaki primer da naučimo zastupanje na cilju, u kojem se prototipi raspoređuju kao most da podijelimo grafske strukture između poznatih ciljeva i nevidljivih. Zatim se napravlja nova metotipska strategija za učenje kontrastivnog grafa, koja je svjesna na cilju, kako bi generalizirala razumnu sposobnost predstavljanja na ciljevima nepoznate ciljeve. Eksperimenti na tri serije podataka o referenciji pokazuju da predloženi pristup postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u zadatku ZSSD-a.', 'si': 'සීරෝ වෙඩි තැනක් හොයාගන්න (ZSSD) අරමුණ වෙනවා පරීක්ෂණ ස්ථානයක් වෙනුවෙන් අදහස් නැති ලක්ෂණයක් හොයාගන මේ පත්තරේ අපි සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සිද්ධා කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සිද්ධි විශේෂයෙන්ම, ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතිසිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාපනය ඉගෙන ගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජ තවත්, අපි හැම උදාහරයෙක්ම ඉලක්කම් අධාරිත ප්\u200dරතිරූපය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිරූපයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, මෙතන ප්\u200dරතිරූපය ප්\u200dරතිරූපයක්  ඊට පස්සේ ලොකු ලක්ෂණ-අනතුරු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ග්\u200dරාෆ් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ඉගෙනගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපයක් සාමාන්\u200dය ව බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ZSSD වැඩේ ස', 'so': "Dalbashada joojinta ah (ZSSD) wuxuu ku qoran yahay inuu ogaado xaaladda la'aanta marka lagu jiro. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa iskuul ka duwan waxbarashada wadajirka ah (JointCL), kaas oo ka mid ah waxbarashada isbedelka ah iyo waxbarashada qaabilaadda ah iyo waxbarashada qaabilaadda u jeeda. Si gaar ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa qorshaha waxbarashada ka hortaga ah si aad ugu fiican u soo bandhigto goobaha lagu garanayo. Markaas waxaa kale oo aan dhisaynaa tusaale kasta tusaale ahaan in lagu barto muuqashada goalka, kuwaas oo lagu soo bandhigaa qaababka qaababka sawirada si ay u qaybsadaan dhismaha sawirada dhexdooda alaabta la yaqaan iyo waxyaalaha qarsoon ee la yaqaan. Markaas waxaa qoraalka waxbarashada oo ka gees ah oo ku qoran qoraalka jimicsiga ee la yaqaan, si loo horumariyo awoodda cilmiga ah oo ku qoran waxyaabaha la jeedo oo la jeedo goobaha aan la arkaynin. Imtixaan dheeraad ah oo ku qoran saddex baaritaanka bangiga ayaa muujiya in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay gaadhaan xaaladda farshaxanka shaqada ZSSD.", 'sv': 'Zero-shot stance Detection (ZSSD) syftar till att upptäcka positionen för ett osynligt mål under inferensstadiet. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett gemensamt kontrastivt lärande (JointCL) ramverk, som består av ställningstagande kontrastivt lärande och målmedvetet prototyp grafkontrastivt lärande. Specifikt används en kontrastiv inlärningsstrategi för att bättre generalisera attitydfunktioner för osynliga mål. Vidare bygger vi en prototyp graf för varje instans för att lära oss den målbaserade representationen, där prototyperna distribueras som en bro för att dela grafstrukturerna mellan de kända målen och de osynliga. Sedan utformas en ny målmedveten prototyp graf kontrastiv inlärningsstrategi för att generalisera resonemanget hos målbaserade ställningstaganden till de osynliga målen. Omfattande experiment på tre benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar att den föreslagna metoden uppnår toppmoderna prestanda i ZSSD-uppgiften.', 'ta': 'சூழ்நிலை நிலை கண்டுபிடி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு இணைய முறைமையான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் (JointCL) சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது முறைமையான கற்றல் மற்றும் அறியும் முனைம குறிப்பிட்டு, ஒரு நிலையான முறைமையான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் திட்டம் செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது மறைக்கப்படாத இலக்குகளுக்கு  மேலும், நாம் ஒவ்வொரு நிகழ்வுக்கும் இலக்கு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள குறிப்பிடுதலை கற்று கொள்வதற்கான ஒரு முனைமாதிரி வரைபடம் உருவாக்குகிறோம், அதில் முனைம பின்னர் ஒரு புதிய இலக்கு அறிந்து கொள்ளும் முனைமை வரைபடம் எதிர்மறை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் திட்டமிடப்பட்டுள்ளது இலக்கு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள நில மூன்று பெங்குரு தரவுத்தளங்களில் விரிவான சோதனைகள் ZSSD பணியில் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமை செயல்பாட்டின் நிலையை ப', 'ur': 'صفر-شٹ موقعیت شناسایی (ZSSD) کا ارادہ ہے کہ inferences مرحلہ میں غیب کی موقعیت کا موقعیت پہچان سکے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مشترک کنٹریسٹ کی تعلیم (JointCL مخصوص طور پر، ایک موقعیت مخالف سیکھنے کا استراتژی بہتر عمومی موقعیت کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. اور ہم ہر مثال کے لئے ایک پروٹوٹیپٹی گراف بناتے ہیں تابع بنیاد کی تصویر کی سیکھنے کے لئے، جس میں پروٹوٹیپٹے ایک پل کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کہ گراف ساختاروں کو معلوم ہوئے موجود اور غیب ہونے والوں کے درمیان شریک کرنے کے لئے۔ پھر ایک نئی تابع معلوم ہونے والی پروٹوٹیپٹی گراف کی کنٹیپٹی سیکھنے والی استراتژی کی تدبیر کی جاتی ہے کہ موقع پر بنیاد ہوئی موقعیت کی منظورت کو غیب ہونے والی موقعیت کے ذریعہ معلوم کرے۔ تین بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر اضافہ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا ZSSD کے کام میں موجود آزمائش کی موجود ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz JointCL (JointCL) o'rganishni bir nechta qismi o'rganishni davom qilamiz. Bu o'rganishni o'rganishni istasangiz va taʼminlovchi prototypik o'rganishni o'rganish mumkin. Ko'rsatilgan o'rganish strategiya yordamida o'rganish holatni yaxshi ko'proq maqsadlar uchun holatning xususiyatlarini yaratish uchun ishlaydi. Koʻrsatilgan, biz har bir misol qanday tashkilotni o'rganish uchun prototypik yaratumiz. Ushbu shakllar bilan nomaʼlum maqolalar va nomaʼlum narsalar orasidagi grafik structurlarini bir darajasi deb tashlanadi. Keyin bir novel obʼektli o'rganish strategiya, o'rganish qismlarining qismlarini aniqlashga qaror qiladi. Uch benchmark maʼlumotlarida kengaytirish imtiyozlari ZSSD vazifasidagi soʻzni bajarishini koʻrsatiladi.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện lập trường không quay (ZSSD) nhằm phát hiện vị trí của một mục tiêu không bị phát hiện trong giai đoạn ám ảnh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở giáo dục tương đối hợp nhau (JointlL) gồm các bài học tương đối và các nguyên mẫu của biểu đồ thị tương phản. Cụ thể, một chiến lược học tương đối được dùng để tổng hợp các yếu tố cho mục tiêu không nhìn thấy. Thêm nữa, chúng ta xây dựng một biểu đồ nguyên mẫu cho mỗi trường hợp để học các mô hình dựa vào mục tiêu, trong đó các nguyên mẫu được sử dụng như một cây cầu để chia sẻ các cấu trúc đồ thị giữa các mục tiêu đã biết và những mục tiêu chưa thấy. Sau đó sẽ có một chiến lược học thuyết thiên văn thiên hướng mới được lập ra để tổng hợp khả năng lập luận của các cử tri dựa trên mục tiêu. Những thí nghiệm dồi dào trên ba bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy phương pháp đề nghị đạt đến hiệu quả tối tân trong nhiệm vụ ZSSD.', 'bg': 'Откриването на позицията с нулев изстрел (ЗСД) има за цел да открие позицията за невидима цел по време на етапа на заключение. В настоящата статия предлагаме съвместна рамка за контрастивно учене (която се състои от контрастивно учене на позиции и прототипно контрастивно учене на графика. По-конкретно се използва стратегия за контрастивно обучение на позицията, за да се обобщят по-добре характеристиките на позицията за невидими цели. Освен това, ние изграждаме прототипна графика за всеки случай, за да научим базираното на целта представяне, в което прототипите са разположени като мост за споделяне на графичните структури между познатите цели и невидимите. След това е разработена нова прототипна графика контрастивна стратегия за учене, която обобщава способността за разсъждаване на базираните на целта позиции представяния към невидимите цели. Обширни експерименти с три сравнителни набора данни показват, че предложеният подход постига най-съвременни резултати в задачата.', 'da': 'Zero-shot stande detection (ZSSD) har til formål at registrere standen for et uset mål i inference stadiet. I denne artikel foreslår vi en fælles kontrastiv læring (JointCL) ramme, som består af stande kontrastiv læring og målbevidst prototyp graf kontrastiv læring. Specielt anvendes der en kontrasterende læringsstrategi til bedre at generalisere holdningsfunktioner for usynlige mål. Derudover bygger vi en prototyp graf for hvert eksempel for at lære den målbaserede repræsentation, hvor prototyperne anvendes som en bro til at dele grafstrukturerne mellem de kendte mål og de usynlige. Derefter er en ny målbevidst prototyp graf kontrastiv læringsstrategi udtænkt for at generalisere ræsonneringsevnen af målbaserede standrepræsentationer til de usynlige mål. Omfattende eksperimenter på tre benchmark datasæt viser, at den foreslåede tilgang opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne i ZSSD-opgaven.', 'nl': 'Zero-shot standdetectie (ZSSD) is bedoeld om de stand voor een onzichtbaar doel te detecteren tijdens de inferentiefase. In dit artikel stellen we een gezamenlijk contrastief leren (JointCL) framework voor, dat bestaat uit standpunt contrastief leren en doelgericht prototypisch grafiek contrastief leren. Specifiek wordt een standpunt contrastieve leerstrategie gebruikt om standpunt kenmerken beter te generaliseren voor onzichtbare doelen. Verder bouwen we voor elke instantie een prototypische grafiek om de target-based representatie te leren, waarin de prototypes worden ingezet als een brug om de grafiekstructuren te delen tussen de bekende en de onzichtbare doelen. Vervolgens wordt een nieuwe doelgerichte prototypische grafiek contrastieve leerstrategie ontwikkeld om het redeneervermogen van doelgerichte standrepresentaties te generaliseren naar de onzichtbare doelen. Uitgebreide experimenten met drie benchmark datasets tonen aan dat de voorgestelde aanpak state-of-the-art prestaties levert in de ZSSD taak.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje nuklearnog stanja (ZSSD) je cilj otkrivanja stanja nevidljivog cilja tijekom faze infekcije. U ovom papiru predlažemo zajednički okvir kontrastivnog učenja (JointCL), koji se sastoji od kontrastivnog učenja stanja i prototipičnog učenja grafika kontrastivnog znanja cilja. Posebno, strategija za učenje kontrastvenog stava zapošljava se za bolju općenitu karakteristiku stanja za nepoznate ciljeve. Nadalje, izgradimo prototipični grafik za svaki primjer kako bi naučili zastupanje na cilju, u kojem se prototipi raspoređuju kao most kako bi dijelili grafske strukture između poznatih ciljeva i nevidljivih. Zatim se napravlja nova prototipična strategija za učenje kontrastivnog grafika svjesnog cilja kako bi generalizirala razumnu sposobnost predstavljanja na ciljevima temeljnih stavova na nepoznatim ciljevima. Prošireni eksperimenti na tri temelja podataka o referenciji pokazuju da predloženi pristup postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u zadatku ZSSD-a.', 'de': 'Die Zero-Shot-Positionserkennung (ZSSD) zielt darauf ab, die Position eines unsichtbaren Ziels während der Inferenzstufe zu erkennen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein gemeinsames kontrastives Lernen (JointCL) vor, das aus kontrastivem Lernen und zielgerichtetem prototypischem Graphen-kontrastivem Lernen besteht. Insbesondere wird eine kontrastive Lernstrategie verwendet, um Haltungsmerkmale für unsichtbare Ziele besser zu verallgemeinern. Weiterhin erstellen wir für jede Instanz einen prototypischen Graphen, um die zielbasierte Darstellung zu erlernen, in der die Prototypen als Brücke eingesetzt werden, um die Graphenstrukturen zwischen den bekannten und den unsichtbaren Zielen zu teilen. Anschließend wird eine neuartige zielbewusste prototypische Graphen-kontrastive Lernstrategie entwickelt, um die Argumentationsfähigkeit von zielbasierten Haltungsdarstellungen auf die unsichtbaren Ziele zu verallgemeinern. Umfangreiche Experimente an drei Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz eine State-of-the-Art-Performance in der ZSSD-Aufgabe erreicht.', 'id': 'Deteksi posisi 0-shot (ZSSD) bermaksud untuk mendeteksi posisi untuk target yang tidak terlihat selama tahap inferensi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian pembelajaran kontras kongsi (JointCL), yang terdiri dari pembelajaran kontras posisi dan pembelajaran kontras grafik prototipik yang sadar target. Secara spesifik, strategi pembelajaran kontras posisi digunakan untuk menyebarkan lebih baik karakteristik posisi untuk target yang tidak terlihat. Selain itu, kami membangun grafik prototipik untuk setiap contoh untuk belajar representation berasaskan sasaran, di mana prototip digunakan sebagai jembatan untuk berbagi struktur grafik antara sasaran yang dikenal dan yang tidak terlihat. Kemudian sebuah strategi pembelajaran kontras grafik yang menyadari sasaran baru disediakan untuk menyebarkan kemampuan alasan dari representation posisi berdasarkan sasaran ke sasaran yang tidak terlihat. Eksperimen luas pada tiga set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan mencapai prestasi terbaik dalam tugas ZSSD.', 'ko': '제로포 자세 탐지(ZSD)는 추리 단계에서 알 수 없는 목표의 자세를 탐지하기 위한 것이다.본고에서 우리는 입장 대비 학습과 목표 감지 원형도 대비 학습을 포함하는 연합 대비 학습(JointCL) 구조를 제시했다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 자세 대비 학습 전략을 채택하여 미지의 목표의 자세 특징을 더욱 잘 요약했다.그 밖에 우리는 모든 실례를 위해 원형도를 구축하여 목표를 바탕으로 하는 표시를 배운다. 그 중에서 원형은 교량으로 배치하여 이미 알고 있는 목표와 보이지 않는 목표 간의 그림 구조를 공유한다.그 다음에 새로운 목표 감지 원형도 대비 학습 전략을 설계하여 목표의 자세를 바탕으로 하는 추리 능력을 미지의 목표로 확대했다.세 가지 벤치마크 데이터 세트의 많은 실험에서 이 방법은 ZSSD 작업에서 가장 최첨단 성능을 달성했다는 것을 알 수 있습니다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی موقعیت صفر (ZSSD) هدف دارد که موقعیت یک هدف غیب در مرحله بیماری را شناسایی کند. در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچوب یادگیری متفاوتی (JointCL) مشترک را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از یادگیری متفاوتی و یادگیری گراف متفاوتی که با هدف آگاهی می\u200cشود، متفاوتی است. مخصوصاً یک استراتژی یادگیری متفاوتی در موقعیت استفاده می\u200cشود تا ویژه\u200cهای موقعیت عمومی برای هدف\u200cهای غیبی بهتر استفاده کند. بعلاوه، ما یک گراف پیش\u200cترتیبی برای هر مثال ساخته می\u200cکنیم تا نمایش هدف را یاد بگیریم که در آن پروتایپ\u200cها به عنوان پل استفاده می\u200cشوند تا ساختارهای گراف بین هدف\u200cهای شناخته شده و نمایش\u200cنشده\u200cها را تقسیم کنند. بعدش یک استراتژی یادگیری متفاوتی از گراف پیش\u200cگونه\u200cای که به هدف\u200cها معرفی می\u200cشود، برای تولید کردن توانایی منطقی از وضعیت\u200cهای موضوع به هدف\u200cها برای هدف\u200cهای غیب\u200cها ساخته می\u200cشود. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای روی سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای نقاشی نشان می\u200cدهد که این دستور پیشنهاد به انجام وضعیت هنری در کار ZSSD رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa msimamo usio na risasi (ZSSD) unalenga kugundua msimamo wa lengo lililofichikana wakati wa jukwaa la maambukizi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa pamoja wa kujifunza tofauti (JointCL), ambao ni pamoja na msimamo mkali wa kujifunza na picha inayofahamika kwa lengo la kujifunza tofauti. Kwa hakika, mkakati wa kujifunza unatumiwa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza vigezo vya msimamo kwa ajili ya malengo yasiyofahamika. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajenga picha ya mifano kwa kila mfano ili kujifunza uwakilishi wa lengo, ambapo mifano inatumiwa kama daraja ili kushirikiana muundo wa picha kati ya malengo yanayojulikana na na yasiyo ya siri. Kisha mkakati wa maarifa wa kiwango kinacholenga maarifa kinachopingana na mpango wa kujifunza unapangwa kutengeneza uwezo wa maana wa kuwawakilisha msimamo wenye lengo hilo kwa lengo lisilo na siri. Majaribio mengi kwenye takwimu tatu za bendera zinaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinaweza kupata hali ya sanaa katika kazi ya ZSSD.', 'tr': '(ZSSD) iňleşik sahypa durmuşy görkezilmedik bir maksadyň durumyny açmak amasynda. Bu kagyzda, biz birnäçe kontrast öwrenmegi (JointCL) çerçevesini teklip edip görýäris. Bu ýerde kontrast öwrenmek we maksadyň prototipik grafik kontrast öwrenmegi bar. Adatça, nähili möhüm bolmadyk hedeflerde nähili möhüm bolup durmuşy çykarmak üçin meýdança çykyş strategiýasy ullanýar. Mundan soňra, her örän maksady tabanly suratlaryny öwrenmek üçin prototik grafyny gurdyrys. Bu ýerde prototipler bilin maksadlaryň we görmezleriň arasynda grafik düzümlerni paylaşmak üçin guruldyrylýar. Soňra, täze maksadat bilen prototipik bir grafik öwrenmek stratejisi görnüşi maksadyň üstüne gollanan durum taýýarlarynyň maksadyny düzenlemek üçin tassyklanýar. Üç benchmark veri setirlerinde döwletli deneyler ZSSD zadynda teklip eden ýagdaýyň durumyny başarýandygyny görkez.', 'af': "Nuwe-skoot staatsonderskrywing (ZSSD) doel om die staanse vir 'n ongesiende doel te beskry tydens die inferensie staatsie. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n saamste kontrastiese leer (JointCL) raamwerk, wat bestaan van staanste kontrastiewe leer en doelwitte prototipiese graaf kontrastiewe leer. Spesifieke is 'n standaard kontrastiewe onderwerp strategie gebruik om beter generelliseer staatsfunksies vir ongestelde doels te maak. Verder bou ons 'n prototipiese graaf vir elke voorbeeld om die doel-gebaseerde voorstelling te leer, waarin die prototipes as 'n brig uitgestel word om die graafstrukture tussen die bekende doels en die ongesiende doels te deel. Dan is 'n nuwe doel-bewys prototipiese graaf kontrastiese leer strategie gedefinieer om die redekende moontlikheid van doel-gebaseerde staatstoestellings te genereer aan die ongesiende doels. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op drie benchmark datastelle vertoon dat die voorgestelde toegang tot staat van die kunstenaar-prestasie in die ZSSD-taak bereik word.", 'sq': 'ZSSD synon të zbulojë qëndrimin për një objektiv të padukshëm gjatë fazës së përfundimit. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një kuadër të përbashkët për mësimin kontrastiv (JointCL), i cili përbëhet nga qëndrimi për mësimin kontrastiv dhe për mësimin kontrastiv prototipik të grafikut me objektiv. Veçanërisht, një qëndrim strategjie mësimi kontraste është përdorur për të gjeneralizuar më mirë karakteristikat e qëndrimit për objektiva të padukshme. Për më tepër, ne ndërtojmë një grafik prototipik për çdo rast për të mësuar përfaqësimin bazuar në objektiv, në të cilin prototipi përdoret si një urë për të ndarë strukturat e grafikut midis objektivave të njohura dhe objektivave të padukshme. Pastaj një strategji e re prototipike për mësimin kontrastiv të grafikut objektiv është hartuar për të gjeneralizuar aftësinë e arsyetimit të përfaqësimeve të qëndrimit bazuar në objektiv ndaj objektivave të padukshme. Eksperimentet e gjera në tre baza të dhënash tregojnë se metoda e propozuar arrin performancë më të lartë në detyrën e ZSSD.', 'am': 'Zero-shot stance detection (ZSSD) በሽብር ክፍል ጊዜ የተሰወረውን የደረጃ ዕቅድን ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የJointCL (JointCL) ፍሬማር የተቃውሞ ትምህርት እና የማስተውለውን ፕሮቶግራፊካዊ ትምህርት ተቃዋሚ ትምህርት የሚኖር ተቃውሞ ትምህርት መግለጫ እና መግለጫ የሚያውቀው ፕሮቶግራፍ እና መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የተቃወመ ትምህርት ተቃውሞ ትምህርት strategy ለመጠቀም የተደረገ የስሜት ግንኙነትን ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ለሁሉም ምሳሌ የተመሳሳይን መልዕክት ለመማር ፕሮግራም እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዚያን ጊዜም የሚታወቀው ፕሮቶግራፊ ትምህርት ትምህርት strategy የሚደረገው የደረጃ መቆጣጠር ወደታወቀው ተቃውሞ የደረጃ አካባቢ ግንኙነት ለመግለጽ ነው፡፡ በሦስት benchmark ዳታዎች ላይ የስፋት ፈተናዎች በZSSD አድራሻ ውስጥ የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት እንዲደርስ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Sıfır-vuruş vəziyyəti (ZSSD) infeksiya səviyyəsində görmədiyim məqsədilə müəyyən edilməsini gözləyir. Bu kağızda, birlikdə müxtəlif öyrənmə (JointCL) çerçevesini təbliğ edirik, ki, həqiqətən, müxtəlif öyrənmə və məqsədilə bilinmiş prototipik grafik müxtəlif öyrənmə içərisindədir. Özellikle, görünmədiyim məqsədilər üçün təsirli təhsil öyrənmə stratejisi daha yaxşı təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilir. Daha sonra, hər məsəl üçün prototipik bir grafik in şa edirik ki, məqsəd temelli göstəricisi öyrənmək üçün prototiplər köprü olaraq yayılır ki, bilinmiş məqsədilər və görmədikləri məqsədilər arasında grafik yapıları paylaşır. Sonra yeni məqsəd bilən prototipik grafik müxtəlif öyrənmə stratejisini təşkil edir ki, məqsəd-təşkil mövzuların görünməyən məqsədilərə təşkil edilməsi üçün dəyişdirilmişdir. Üç benchmark veri qurularında genişliyi eksperimentlər təklif edilən metodların ZSSD işlərində müəyyən edilmiş təqdirdə başa düşəcəyini göstərər.', 'bn': 'জিএসএসডি’র উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে দুর্ভোগের সময় একটি অদৃশ্য লক্ষ্যের অবস্থান সনাক্ত করা। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি যৌথ বিরোধী শিক্ষা প্রস্তাব করছি (জোয়েন্ট সিএল) ফ্রেমের কাঠামো যার মধ্যে রয়েছে বিরোধী শিক্ষা এবং লক্ষ্য-পরিচিত প্রোটোট বিশেষ করে, অদৃশ্য লক্ষ্যবস্তুর জন্য একটি বিরোধী শিক্ষা কৌশল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এছাড়াও, আমরা টার্গেট ভিত্তিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে প্রত্যেক উদাহরণের জন্য একটি প্রোটোটোটিপিক্যাল গ্রাফ তৈরি করি, যেখানে প্রোটোটোটিপগুলো পরিচিত লক তারপর লক্ষ্য পরিচিত প্রোটোটিপিক্যাল গ্রাফ বিরোধী শিক্ষা কৌশল পরিকল্পনা করা হয়েছে গোপন লক্ষ্যের লক্ষ্যে লক্ষ্য ভিত্তিক অবস্থানের প্রতি Extensive experiments on three benchmark datasets show that the proposed approach achieves state-of-the-art performance in the ZSSD task.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje stanja nula pucnjave (ZSSD) je cilj otkrivanja stanja nepoznate mete tijekom faze infekcije. U ovom papiru predlažemo zajednički okvir kontrastivnog učenja (JointCL), koji se sastoji od kontrastivnog učenja stanja i prototipičnog učenja kontrastivnog grafa na cilju. Posebno, strategija kontrastivnog učenja stanja je zaposlena za bolju generalizaciju karakteristika stanja za nevidljive ciljeve. Nadalje, izgradimo prototipični grafik za svaki primjer da naučimo zastupanje na cilju, u kojem se prototipi raspoređuju kao most da podijelimo grafske strukture između poznatih ciljeva i nevidljivih. Zatim se napravlja nova prototipična strategija za učenje kontrastivnog grafika svjesnog cilja kako bi generalizirala razumnu sposobnost predstavljanja na ciljevima temeljnih stavova na nepoznatim ciljevima. Prošireni eksperimenti na tri temelja podataka o referenciji pokazuju da predloženi pristup postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u zadatku ZSSD-a.', 'hy': 'Զերո-կրակի դիրքի հայտնաբերումը (ZSSD) նպատակն է հայտնաբերել անտեսանելի նպատակի դիրքը հետեւանքների ժամանակ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ընդհանուր հակադրական ուսումնասիրության (JoINTLC) շրջանակ, որը կազմված է դիրքի հակադրական ուսումնասիրությունից և նպատակով գիտակցած նախատիպիկ գրաֆիկի հակադրական ուսումնասիրությունից: Մասնավորապես, դիրքի կոնտրաստիվ ուսուցման ռազմավարությունը օգտագործվում է ավելի լավ ընդհանուր դիրքի հատկությունների լայնացնելու համար անտեսանելի նպատակների համար: Ավելին, յուրաքանչյուր օրինակի համար մենք կառուցում ենք նախատիպիկ գծագիր, որպեսզի սովորենք նպատակի հիմնված ներկայացումը, որտեղ նախատիպիները օգտագործվում են որպես կամուրջ, որպեսզի կիսվեն գծագիր կառուցվածքները հայտնի նպատակների և անտեսանելի Այնուհետև ստեղծվում է նոր նպատակով գիտակցած նախատիպիկ գծագրի կոնտրաստիվ ուսումնական ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի ընդհանրացնենք նպատակով հիմնված դիրքի ներկայացումների մտածողական կարողությունը անտեսանելի նպատակների վրա: Extensive experiments on three benchmark datasets show that the proposed approach achieves state-of-the-art performance in the ZSSD task.', 'et': 'Nulllasu asendituvastuse (ZSSD) eesmärk on tuvastada nähtamatu sihtmärgi asend järeldusetapis. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ühise kontrastiivse õppe (JointCL) raamistiku, mis koosneb asendi kontrastiivsest õppest ja sihtmärkidest teadlikust prototüüpilisest graafilisest kontrastiivsest õppest. Konkreetselt kasutatakse seisukoha kontrastset õppestrateegiat, et paremini üldistada seisukoha funktsioone nähtamatute eesmärkide jaoks. Lisaks ehitame igale eksemplarile prototüüpilise graafiku, et õppida sihtpõhist esitust, kus prototüübid on paigaldatud sillana graafikute struktuuride jagamiseks tuntud sihtmärkide ja nähtamatute vahel. Seejärel töötatakse välja uus sihtmärgiteadlik prototüüpiline graafiline kontrastiivne õppestrateegia, et üldistada sihtmärgipõhiste seisukohtade esitamise arutlusvõime nähtamatutele sihtmärkidele. Põhjalikud katsed kolme võrdlusandmekogumiga näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis saavutab ZSSD ülesande tipptasemel jõudluse.', 'fi': 'Nollalaukauksen asentotunnistus (ZSSD) pyrkii havaitsemaan näkymättömän kohteen asennon johtovaiheessa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme yhteistä kontrastioppimista (JointCL), joka koostuu asennon kontrastioppimisesta ja kohdetietoisesta prototyypillisestä kontrastioppimisesta. Erityisesti asennon kontrastiivista oppimisstrategiaa käytetään yleistämään asennon ominaisuuksia näkymättömiin kohteisiin. Lisäksi rakennamme jokaiselle tapaukselle prototyypin kuvaajan oppiaksemme kohdepohjaisen edustuksen, jossa prototyypit otetaan käyttöön siltana graafirakenteiden jakamiseksi tunnettujen kohteiden ja näkymättömien välillä. Tämän jälkeen kehitetään uusi kohdetietoinen prototyypillinen graafinen kontrastinen oppimisstrategia yleistämään kohdepohjaisten asentoesitysten päättelykykyä näkymättömiin kohteisiin. Laajat kokeilut kolmella vertailuaineistolla osoittavat, että ehdotetulla lähestymistavalla saavutetaan ZSSD-tehtävän huipputekninen suorituskyky.', 'ca': "La detecció de posició zero-shot (ZSSD) mira a detectar la posició d'un objectiu invisible durant l'etapa de la inferència. En aquest paper, proposem un marc conjunt d'aprenentatge contrastiu (JointCL), que consisteix en aprenentatge contrastiu de posició i aprenentatge contrastiu prototipik de gràfic conscient de l'objectiu. En concret, s'utilitza una estratègia d'aprenentatge contrastiu per generalitzar millor les característiques de posició per als objectius invisibles. Further, we build a prototypical graph for each instance to learn the target-based representation, in which the prototypes are deployed as a bridge to share the graph structures between the known targets and the unseen ones.  Llavors es dissenya una nova estratègia d'aprenentatge contrastiu prototípic de gràfic conscient de l'objectiu per generalitzar l'habilitat de raonament de les representacions de posició basada en l'objectiu als objectius invisibles. Els extensos experiments en tres conjunts de dades de referència demostren que l'enfocament proposat aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat en la tasca ZSSD.", 'cs': 'Detekce pozice nulového výstřelu (ZSSD) má za cíl detekovat postoj neviditelného cíle během fáze inference. V tomto článku navrhujeme rámec společného kontrastivního učení (JointCL), který se skládá ze postojového kontrastivního učení a cílově orientovaného prototypického grafového kontrastivního učení. Konkrétně je použita strategie kontrastního učení postojů pro lepší zobecnění postojů pro neviděné cíle. Dále vytvoříme prototypický graf pro každou instanci, abychom se naučili cílově založenou reprezentaci, ve které jsou prototypy nasazeny jako most pro sdílení grafových struktur mezi známými a neviditelnými cíli. Následně je navržena nová strategie kontrastního učení s cílem zobecnit schopnost uvažování cílových reprezentací postojů na neviditelné cíle. Rozsáhlé experimenty na třech referenčních datových sadách ukazují, že navržený přístup dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu v úloze ZSSD.', 'jv': 'uput Nan pepulan iki, kita mulai nggawe sistem sing kompatif (JointCL) shift Daalé, kita mbukak prototipik graf kanggo saben kesemplu kanggo ngerti pawartos tarjamahan sing nggawe basa tarjamahan, ning kedhanan prototipi padha ngedeplase ungot kanggo ngerasakno graf dumaten keybindi nggo ngerasakno cilbengan ingkang cah dumaten Unde batir tho dadi sing diranggunakno prototipik, ingkang karbote Jejaring AllProgressBar', 'ha': "Zaman gano staniya na sifilo (ZSSD) don ya yi amfani da ya gane halin da aka ɓõye ba a lokacin da aka nuna shi. Ga wannan karatun, Munã bukãtar da wani karatun da aka samu karatun (JoinCL), wanda ke cikin karatun da karatun da zane da tsari na tsari da karatun na tsari da wajen sani. A ƙayyade, an yi amfani da tunci mai fassara na karantawa don ya fi zama mai kyau ga sasalin wasu fassarar wurãre wa tsarin da ba'a sani ba. Furan, muna samar da wani grafi wa kõwane misali dõmin ka sanar masu tsari da aka ƙayyade goan, a cikinsa, za'a saka misalin su kamar birgo dõmin su yi raba matsayin grafi tsakanin goan da ba'a sani ba. Sa'an nan an ƙayyade kimar da aka sanar da wani na takarda fasafa masu yiwuwa da aka sanar da shi a yanzu, dõmin a ƙididdige abincin da ke rubutun fassarar halaikin da aka ƙayyade zuwa ga goan da ba'a sani ba. Ƙaramiwa masu shimfiɗaɗãwa kan danna uku na bangon ayuka na nuna cewa shirin da aka buƙata ta kai halin-kunyar cikin aikin ZSSD.", 'he': 'זיהוי עמדת ירי אפס (ZSSD) מתכוון לזהות את עמדת המטרה של מטרה בלתי נראית במהלך שלב ההנחה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת לימוד נוגדי משותפת (JointCL), שמתכילה מלימוד נוגדי עמדה ולימוד נוגדי גרף מודע למטרה. במיוחד, אסטרטגיה ללמוד בניגוד לעמדה משתמשת כדי לגנרליזציה טובה יותר את תכונות העמדה למטרות בלתי נראות. נוסף מזה, אנו בונים גרף פרוטיפי לכל דוגמה כדי ללמוד את היציגה המבוססת על המטרה, שבה הארוטוטיפים משתמשים כגשר לחלוק את מבני הגרף בין המטרות הידועות לבין המטרות הלא נראות. ואז מתכננה אסטרטגיה של לימוד נגד גרף מודעת למטרה חדשה כדי לגנרל את יכולת ההיגיון של מייצגות עמדה מבוססת במטרה למטרות בלתי נראות. ניסויים רחבים בשלושה קבוצות נתונים רמזים מראים שהגישה המוצעת משיגה ביצועים חדשים במשימת ZSSD.', 'sk': 'Namen zaznavanja položaja z ničelnim strelom (ZSSD) je zaznavanje položaja za nevidno tarčo v fazi sklepanja. V prispevku predlagamo skupni kontrastni okvir učenja (JointCL), ki je sestavljen iz kontrastnega učenja stališča in prototipnega grafskega kontrastnega učenja. Natančneje se uporablja kontrastna strategija učenja stališča za boljše posploševanje funkcij stališča za nevidne cilje. Poleg tega za vsak primer zgradimo prototipski graf, da se naučimo predstavitve na osnovi cilja, v katerem so prototipi postavljeni kot most za delitev grafskih struktur med znanimi in nevidnimi cilji. Nato je oblikovana nova prototipna grafična kontrastna učna strategija, ki se zaveda cilja, ki posploši sposobnost razmišljanja predstavitev stališča na podlagi cilja do nevidnih ciljev. Obsežni poskusi na treh referenčnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da predlagani pristop dosega najsodobnejšo zmogljivost opravila ZSSD.', 'bo': 'Zero-shot་གནས་སྟངས་རྟོགས་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་མཚམས་འཇུག་སྐབས་སུ་མེད་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་རྟོགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་ཁག་ཅིག་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཁྱད་པར་ནི། མ་ཤེས་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཐད་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་བསམ་མཐུན་ཡོད་པ་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། Further, we build a prototypical graph for each instance to learn the target-based representation, in which the prototypes are deployed as a bridge to share the graph structures between the known targets and the unseen ones. དེ་ནས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་དྲན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་པའི་རྣམ་པ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཐད་ཚོར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱད་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་པས། རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་བརྟག་སྟངས་ལ་འཆར'}
{'en': 'Meta-learning via Language Model In-context Tuning', 'ar': '[CASPI] تحسين السياسة الآمنة المدرك للسببية للحوار الموجه نحو المهام', 'pt': '[CASPI] Melhoria da política segura com reconhecimento de causa para o diálogo orientado a tarefas', 'es': '[CASPI] Mejora de políticas seguras con conciencia causal para un diálogo orientado a tareas', 'fr': '[CASPI] Amélioration de la politique de sécurité consciente des causes pour un dialogue axé sur les tâches', 'ja': '[CASPI]タスク指向の対話のための因果関係を意識した安全な政策の改善', 'zh': '[卡斯皮] 因果意之安政改进,以成对面之对', 'hi': '[CASPI] कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद के लिए कारण-जागरूक सुरक्षित नीति सुधार', 'ru': '[CASPI] Улучшение безопасной политики с учетом причинно-следственной связи для диалога, ориентированного на решение конкретных задач', 'ga': '[CASPI] Feabhsú Beartais Sábháilte atá feasach ar Cúiseanna le haghaidh Idirphlé Tascbhunaithe', 'ka': '[CASPI] საკუთარი შეცდომა საქაღალდე დამუშავებელი პოლიტიკის გასაკეთება', 'hu': '[CASPI] Okozatudatos biztonságos politikai javítás feladatorientált párbeszédhez', 'el': '[CASPI] Αιτιολογική Ασφαλής Βελτίωση Πολιτικής για διάλογο προσανατολισμένο στα καθήκοντα', 'it': '[CASPI] Miglioramento sicuro delle politiche per il dialogo orientato alle attività', 'lt': '[CASPI] Saugios politikos, susijusios su užduotimis, gerinimas su priežastimi', 'kk': '[CASPI] Тапсырма бағытталған диалогтың қауіпсіздік ережелерді жақсарту', 'mk': '[CASPI] Подобрување на безбедната политика со свесност за причината за дијалог ориентиран на задачите', 'ms': '[CASPI] Penyebab-sedar Kebaikan Polisi Selamat untuk Dialog Berorientasi Tugas', 'ml': '[CASPI] ജോലി തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഡയലോഗിനുള്ള സുരക്ഷിതമായ പോളിസി മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്', 'mn': '[CASPI] Хэрэв шалтгаан мэдэхгүй аюулгүй бодлогын хөгжүүлэлт нь ажлын ориентиролт диалогын тулд', 'mt': '[CASPI] Titjib fil-Politika ta’ Sigurtà għal Djalogu orjentat lejn ix-Xogħol b’għarfien kawżali', 'pl': '[CASPI] Doskonalenie bezpiecznej polityki na potrzeby dialogu zorientowanego na zadania', 'no': '[CASPI] Utforbetring av tryggleiksrettighet for oppgåveorientert dialogvindauge', 'ro': '[CASPI] Îmbunătățirea politicilor sigure conștiente de cauză pentru dialogul orientat spre sarcini', 'sr': '[CASPI] Poboljšanje sigurne politike na optužnici za dijalog orientisan na zadatke', 'si': '[CASPI] ක්\u200dරියාකාරීය සඳහා ආරක්ෂාත්මක පොලිසිය සුදුසුම් කරනවා', 'so': '[CASPI] Causal-aware Security Policy Improvement of Tax-oriented Dialog', 'sv': '[CASPI] Orsaksmedveten säker policyförbättring för uppgiftsinriktad dialog', 'ta': '[CASPI] பணி திருத்தப்பட்ட உரையாடலுக்கான பயனற்ற பாதுகாப்பு கொள்கை மேம்படுத்தல்', 'ur': '[CASPI] غفلت جانتا ہے کہ امن پالیسی تغییر کے لئے کام کی طرف متوجہ ہونے کے لئے', 'vi': '(CAPI) Biết sơ về biện pháp an toàn', 'uz': '@ info', 'bg': 'Подобряване на безопасната политика за ориентиран към задачите диалог', 'nl': '[CASPI] Causale bewuste veilige beleidsverbetering voor taakgerichte dialoog', 'hr': '[CASPI] Poboljšanje sigurne politike na optužnici za dijalog orientiran na zadatke', 'da': '[CASPI] Årsagsbevidst sikker politik forbedring for opgaveorienteret dialog', 'de': '[CASPI] Causal-bewusste Safe Policy Improvement für aufgabenorientierten Dialog', 'id': '[CASPI] Penembahan kebijakan yang aman untuk Dialog Orientasi Tugas', 'ko': '[CASPI] 임무 가이드 대화에 대한 인과 의식 보안 정책 개선', 'fa': 'تأثیر سیاست امن در مورد صحبت مستقیم', 'sw': '[CASPI] Mabadiliko ya Sera ya Usalama wenye ufahamu wa usalama kwa ajili ya Dialog inayoongozwa na kazi', 'tr': 'Görev Görniş Görniş Opşenleri Güýtgetmek Politiki Ewirleýşenler', 'af': '[CASPI] Bevestiging-bevestig veiligheidbeleid Verbetering vir Opdrag-orienteerde dialoog', 'sq': '[CASPI] Përmirësim i politikës së sigurtë për dialog të orientuar në detyra', 'az': '[CASPI] G칬z톛l t톛r톛find톛n t톛hl칲k톛siz G칲venlik Siyas캼 D칲z톛ltm톛si', 'hy': 'Պատճառներով գիտակցած ապահով քաղաքականության բարելավումը', 'am': '[CASPI] Causal-aware Safe Policy Improvement for Task-oriented Dialog', 'bn': '[CASPI] ক্যাসাল-সচেতনতা নিরাপত্তা নীতির উন্নতি কাজ করার জন্য ডায়ালগ', 'ca': '[CASPI] Mejora de la política de seguretat conscient de les causes per al diàleg orientat a les tasques', 'bs': '[CASPI] Optuženo poboljšanje sigurne politike za dijalog orientiran na zadatke', 'cs': '[CASPI] Bezpečné zlepšení politiky pro dialog orientovaný na úkoly', 'et': '[CASPI] Põhjuslik ohutu poliitika parandamine ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogi jaoks', 'fi': '[CASPI] Aihetietoiset turvalliset toimintaperiaatteet tehtäväkeskeisessä vuoropuhelussa', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': '[CASPI] Varno izboljšanje politike, ki se zaveda vzrokov, za dialog, usmerjen v naloge', 'bo': '[CASPI] ཉར་འཛུགས་ནུས་བདེ་འཇགས་ངང་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གླེང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བཅོས།', 'he': '[CASPI] שיפור מדיניות בטוחה מודעת לגורם לדיולוג ממוקד למשימות'}
{'en': 'The goal of meta-learning is to learn to adapt to a new task with only a few labeled examples. Inspired by the recent progress in large language models, we propose \\textit{in-context tuning} (ICT), which recasts task adaptation and prediction as a simple sequence prediction problem: to form the input sequence, we concatenate the task instruction, labeled in-context examples, and the target input to predict; to meta-train the model to learn from in-context examples, we fine-tune a pre-trained language model (LM) to predict the target label given the input sequence on a collection of tasks.We benchmark our method on two collections of text classification tasks: LAMA and BinaryClfs. Compared to MAML which adapts the model through gradient descent, our method leverages the inductive bias of pre-trained LMs to perform pattern matching, and outperforms MAML by an absolute 6% average AUC-ROC score on BinaryClfs, gaining more advantage with increasing model size. Compared to non-fine-tuned in-context learning (i.e. prompting a raw LM), in-context tuning meta-trains the model to learn from in-context examples. On BinaryClfs, ICT improves the average AUC-ROC score by an absolute 10%, and reduces the variance due to example ordering by 6x and example choices by 2x.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما يُعزى النجاح الأخير للتعلم المعزز (RL) في حل المهام المعقدة إلى قدرته على استكشاف واستغلال البيئة.\nعادة لا تكون كفاءة العينة مشكلة بالنسبة للمهام التي تستخدم أجهزة محاكاة رخيصة لأخذ عينات من البيانات عبر الإنترنت.\nمن ناحية أخرى ، عادةً ما يتم تعلم الحوارات الموجهة نحو المهام (ToD) من البيانات غير المتصلة التي تم جمعها باستخدام المظاهرات البشرية.\nإن جمع العروض المتنوعة وتعليقها أمر مكلف.\nلسوء الحظ ، فإن سياسة القراءة والكتابة المدربة على البيانات الخارجة عن السياسة عرضة لقضايا التحيز والتعميم ، والتي تتفاقم بسبب العشوائية في الاستجابة البشرية والطبيعة غير الماركوفية لحالة المعتقد المشروحة لنظام إدارة الحوار.\nولهذه الغاية ، نقترح إطار عمل RL للدفعة لتعلم سياسة ToD: تحسين السياسة الآمنة المدرك للسببية (CASPI).\nيتضمن CASPI آلية لتعلم المكافأة الدقيقة التي تلتقط النية وراء الاستجابة البشرية وتقدم أيضًا ضمانًا على أداء سياسة الحوار مقابل خط الأساس. نوضح فعالية إطار العمل هذا في مهمة الحوار الشامل لمجموعة البيانات Multiwoz2.0. تتفوق الطريقة المقترحة على الحالة الحالية للفن. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر كفاءة العينة ، حيث يتم تدريب طريقتنا فقط على 20 \\٪ من البيانات ، وهي قابلة للمقارنة مع أحدث الأساليب المدربة على بيانات 100 \\٪ على اثنين من مقاييس التقييم.', 'pt': 'O sucesso recente do aprendizado por reforço (RL) na resolução de tarefas complexas é frequentemente atribuído à sua capacidade de explorar e explorar um ambiente.\nA eficiência da amostra geralmente não é um problema para tarefas com simuladores baratos para amostrar dados online.\nPor outro lado, Diálogos Orientados a Tarefas (ToD) geralmente são aprendidos a partir de dados offline coletados usando demonstrações humanas.\nColetar diversas demonstrações e anotá-las é caro.\nInfelizmente, a política de RL treinada em dados fora da política é propensa a questões de viés e generalização, que são ainda mais exacerbadas pela estocasticidade na resposta humana e pela natureza não markoviana do estado de crença anotado de um sistema de gerenciamento de diálogo.\nPara esse fim, propomos uma estrutura de RL em lote para aprendizado de políticas de ToD: Melhoria de política segura com reconhecimento de causa (CASPI).\nO CASPI inclui um mecanismo para aprender recompensas refinadas que captura a intenção por trás da resposta humana e também oferece garantia no desempenho da política de diálogo em relação a uma linha de base. Demonstramos a eficácia desta estrutura na tarefa de diálogo de ponta a ponta do conjunto de dados Multiwoz2.0. O método proposto supera o atual estado da arte. Além disso, demonstramos a eficiência da amostra, onde nosso método treinado apenas em 20\\% dos dados, é comparável ao método atual de última geração treinado em 100\\% de dados em duas métricas de avaliação.', 'fr': "Le récent succès de l'apprentissage par renforcement (RL) dans la résolution de tâches complexes est souvent attribué à sa capacité d'explorer et d'exploiter un environnement.\nL'efficacité des échantillons n'est généralement pas un problème pour les tâches utilisant des simulateurs bon marché pour échantillonner des données en ligne.\nD'autre part, les Dialogues orientés sur les tâches (ToD) s'apprennent généralement à partir de données hors ligne collectées à l'aide de démonstrations humaines.\nCollecter diverses démonstrations et les annoter coûte cher.\nMalheureusement, les politiques de RL formées sur des données hors politique sont sujettes à des problèmes de biais et de généralisation, qui sont encore exacerbés par la stochasticité de la réponse humaine et la nature non markovienne de l'état de croyance annoté d'un système de gestion du dialogue.\nÀ cette fin, nous proposons un cadre Batch-RL pour l'apprentissage des politiques de ToD\xa0: Casal-aware Safe Policy Improvement (CASPI). \nCASPI comprend un mécanisme permettant d'apprendre une récompense fine qui saisit l'intention derrière la réponse humaine et offre également une garantie sur la performance de la politique de dialogue par rapport à une base de référence. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de ce cadre sur la tâche de dialogue de bout en bout du jeu de données Multiwoz2.0. Le procédé proposé surpasse l'état actuel de la technique. De plus, nous démontrons l'efficacité de l'échantillon, où notre méthode entraînée uniquement sur 20\xa0\\\xa0% des données est comparable à la méthode actuelle de pointe formée sur 100\xa0\\\xa0% de données sur deux des trois métriques d'évaluation.", 'es': 'El éxito reciente del aprendizaje por refuerzo (RL) en la resolución de tareas complejas se atribuye a menudo a su capacidad para explorar y explotar un entorno.\nLa eficiencia de las muestras no suele ser un problema para las tareas con simuladores baratos para muestrear datos en línea.\nPor otro lado, los Diálogos Orientados a Tareas (ToD) generalmente se aprenden a partir de datos fuera de línea recopilados mediante demostraciones humanas.\nRecopilar demostraciones diversas y hacer anotaciones en ellas es caro.\nDesafortunadamente, la política de RL capacitada en datos fuera de la política es propensa a problemas de sesgo y generalización, que se ven exacerbados por la estocasticidad en la respuesta humana y la naturaleza no markoviana del estado de creencia anotado de un sistema de gestión del diálogo.\nCon este fin, proponemos un marco de RL por lotes para el aprendizaje de políticas de ToD: Casal-aware Safe Policy Improvement (CASPI). \nCASPI incluye un mecanismo para aprender una recompensa detallada que captura la intención detrás de la respuesta humana y también ofrece garantía sobre el desempeño de la política de diálogo en función de una línea de base. Demostramos la eficacia de este marco en la tarea de diálogo de extremo a extremo del conjunto de datos Multiwoz2.0. El método propuesto supera al estado actual de la técnica. Además, demostramos la eficiencia de la muestra, donde nuestro método entrenado solo en el 20\\% de los datos, es comparable al método actual del estado de la técnica entrenado en datos del 100\\% en dos métricas de evaluación.', 'ja': '複雑な課題を解決するための強化学習（ RL ）の最近の成功は、多くの場合、環境を探索し、活用する能力に起因する。\nサンプル効率は、通常、安価なシミュレータを使用してオンラインでデータをサンプリングするタスクにとって問題ではありません。\n一方、タスク指向対話（ ToD ）は、通常、人間のデモンストレーションを使用して収集されたオフラインデータから学習されます。\n多様なデモンストレーションを収集し、それらに注釈を付けるのは費用がかかります。\n残念ながら、政策外データでトレーニングされたRLポリシーは、偏見と一般化の問題を引き起こしやすく、人間の反応の確率論と対話管理システムの注釈付き信念状態の非マルコフ的性質によってさらに悪化します。\nそのために、ToDポリシー学習のためのバッチ- RLフレームワーク： Causal - awareness Safe Policy Improvement （ CASPI ）を提案します。 \nCaspiには、人間の対応の背後にある意図を捉え、ベースラインに対する対話方針のパフォーマンスを保証する、細かい報酬を学ぶメカニズムが含まれています。 Multiwoz2.0データセットのエンドツーエンドのダイアログタスクで、このフレームワークの有効性を実証します。 提案された方法は、現在の最先端技術を上回る。 さらに、サンプル効率を実証します。ここでは、当社の方法は、データの20 \\%のみでトレーニングされており、100 \\%のデータでトレーニングされた現行の最先端の方法と同等です。', 'zh': '化学(RL)近决杂务之成归因于常究其境用。\n于用廉价模拟器在线采样数者,采样效率常非也。\n其一,向任之对(ToD)常从用人工演收离线数学之。\n集诸演而贵之。\n不幸者,以数RL易见泛化,而人随机性对管理系统注非马尔可夫性益剧也。\n因言ToD策学之批处理RL框架:因果感知安全策略改(CASPI)。 \nCASPI一学细粒度赏之机,机得人应背之意,而资之于基线下。 展其框架于 Multiwoz2.0 数之端有效性。 所上法优于今技术水平。 又示样本效率,唯20\\%数训练,与最先进之法,于两评指标上100\\%数有可比性。', 'hi': 'जटिल कार्यों को हल करने में सुदृढीकरण सीखने (आरएल) की हालिया सफलता को अक्सर एक पर्यावरण का पता लगाने और शोषण करने की क्षमता के लिए जिम्मेदार ठहराया जाता है।\nनमूना दक्षता आमतौर पर सस्ते सिमुलेटर के साथ कार्यों के लिए एक मुद्दा नहीं है डेटा ऑनलाइन नमूना करने के लिए।\nदूसरी ओर, कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद (टीओडी) आमतौर पर मानव प्रदर्शनों का उपयोग करके एकत्र किए गए ऑफ़लाइन डेटा से सीखे जाते हैं।\nविविध प्रदर्शनों को इकट्ठा करना और उन्हें एनोटेट करना महंगा है।\nदुर्भाग्य से, ऑफ-पॉलिसी डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित आरएल नीति पूर्वाग्रह और सामान्यीकरण के मुद्दों के लिए प्रवण है, जो मानव प्रतिक्रिया में स्टोकेस्टिकिटी और संवाद प्रबंधन प्रणाली के एनोटेटेड विश्वास राज्य की गैर-मार्कोवियन प्रकृति से और अधिक बढ़ जाती है।\nइस अंत के लिए, हम ToD नीति सीखने के लिए एक बैच-RL ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: कारण-जागरूक सुरक्षित नीति सुधार (CASPI)। \nCASPI में ठीक-ठाक इनाम सीखने के लिए एक तंत्र शामिल है जो मानव प्रतिक्रिया के पीछे इरादे को कैप्चर करता है और बेसलाइन के खिलाफ संवाद नीति के प्रदर्शन पर गारंटी भी प्रदान करता है। हम Multiwoz2.0 डेटासेट के एंड-टू-एंड संवाद कार्य पर इस ढांचे की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। प्रस्तावित विधि कला की वर्तमान स्थिति को मात देती है। इसके अलावा हम नमूना दक्षता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, जहां हमारी विधि केवल 20% डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित होती है, वहां के मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक में से दो पर 100\\ % डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित कला विधि की वर्तमान स्थिति के बराबर होती है।', 'ru': 'Недавний успех обучения подкреплению (RL) в решении сложных задач часто приписывается его способности исследовать и эксплуатировать среду.\nЭффективность выборки обычно не является проблемой для задач с дешевыми тренажерами для выборки данных онлайн.\nС другой стороны, целевые диалоги (ToD) обычно извлекаются из офлайн-данных, собранных с использованием демонстраций людей.\nСбор разнообразных демонстраций и их аннотирование - это дорого.\nК сожалению, политика RL, обученная внеполитическим данным, подвержена проблемам предвзятости и  обобщения, которые еще больше усугубляются стохастичностью реакции человека и немарковским характером аннотированного состояния убеждений системы управления диалогом.\nС этой целью мы предлагаем пакетную структуру RL для изучения политики ToD: Causal-aware Safe Policy Improvement (CASPI). \nCASPI включает в себя механизм для изучения мелкозернистой награды, которая отражает намерения, стоящие за реакцией человека, а также обеспечивает гарантию эффективности политики диалога в сравнении с базовой линией. Мы демонстрируем эффективность этого фреймворка в решении задачи сквозного диалога в наборе данных Multiwoz2.0. Предложенный способ превосходит современное состояние техники. Кроме того, мы демонстрируем эффективность выборки, когда наш метод, обученный только на 20% данных, сопоставим с текущим уровнем техники метода, обученного на 100% данных по двум из них оценочных показателей.', 'ga': 'Is minic go gcuirtear rath na foghlama treisithe le déanaí maidir le tascanna casta a réiteach i leith a cumas timpeallacht a iniúchadh agus a shaothrú.\nGo hiondúil ní fadhb í éifeachtacht shamplach maidir le tascanna le hionsamhlóirí saora chun sonraí a shampláil ar líne.\nAr an láimh eile, is gnách go bhfoghlaimítear Comhphlé Tasc-Dírithe (ToD) ó shonraí as líne a bhailítear ag baint úsáide as taispeántais daonna.\nTá sé costasach taispeántais éagsúla a bhailiú agus iad a anótáil.\nAr an drochuair, tá claonadh ag saincheisteanna maidir le claonadh agus ginearálú ar bheartas RL atá oilte ar shonraí lasmuigh den bheartas, atá níos measa fós ag stochasticity i bhfreagra an duine agus nádúr neamh-Markovian de staid chreidimh anótáilte de chóras bainistíochta idirphlé.\nChuige sin, molaimid creat baisc-RL d’fhoghlaim beartais TD: Feabhsú Beartais Sábháilte ar an eolas faoi chásanna (CASPI).\nÁiríonn CASPI meicníocht chun luach saothair mhionsonraithe a fhoghlaim a áiríonn an rún atá taobh thiar de fhreagra an duine agus a thugann ráthaíocht freisin maidir le feidhmíocht an bheartais idirphlé i gcoinne bunlíne. Léirímid éifeachtacht an chreata seo ar thasc idirphlé ceann go ceann an tacar sonraí Multiwoz2.0. Tá an modh molta níos fearr ná an úrscothacht faoi láthair. Ina theannta sin léirímid éifeachtúlacht samplach, áit nach bhfuil ár modh oilte ach ar 20 \\% de na sonraí, inchomparáide leis an modh úrscothach faoi oiliúint ar shonraí 100 \\% ar dhá mhéadracht mheastóireachta as sin.', 'hu': 'A megerősítő tanulás (RL) komplex feladatok megoldásában a közelmúltbeli sikerét gyakran annak tulajdonítja, hogy képes feltárni és kihasználni egy környezetet.', 'it': "Il recente successo dell'apprendimento di rinforzo (RL) nella risoluzione di compiti complessi è spesso attribuito alla sua capacità di esplorare e sfruttare un ambiente.", 'kk': 'Комплекс тапсырмаларды шешу үшін жуырдағы оқытудың (RL) жаңа жетістігі көбінесе ортасын зерттеу және қолдану мүмкіндігіне арналған.', 'el': 'Η πρόσφατη επιτυχία της ενισχυτικής μάθησης στην επίλυση πολύπλοκων εργασιών αποδίδεται συχνά στην ικανότητά της να διερευνά και να εκμεταλλεύεται ένα περιβάλλον.', 'ka': 'მხოლოდ კომპლექსიკური საქმედების გარეშე შემდეგი წარმატების შესაძლებლობა (RL) გარეშე იქნება მისი შესაძლებლობაზე გარეშე და გამოვიყენოთ გარეშე.', 'ml': 'പരിസ്ഥിതി പരിശോധിക്കാനും പരിശോധിക്കാനും പരിസ്ഥിതി പരിശോധിക്കാനും അടുത്ത വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ വിജയത്തിനാണ്.', 'ms': 'Keberhasilan belakangan ini dalam penyelesaian tugas kompleks (RL) sering ditanggung oleh kemampuannya untuk mengeksplorasi dan mengeksplorasi persekitaran.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед комплекс үйл ажиллагааг шийдэхэд суралцах (RL) суралцах хөгжлийн амжилт ихэвчлэн орчин тойроныг судлах, ашиглах боломжтой байдаг.', 'no': 'Det siste suksessen på å forstørra utviklinga (RL) i å løysa komplekse oppgåver er ofte attribuert til kapasiteten til å utforske og eksplodere eit miljø.', 'pl': 'Ostatni sukces uczenia się wzmacniającego (RL) w rozwiązywaniu złożonych zadań jest często przypisywany jego zdolności do badania i eksploatacji środowiska.', 'lt': 'The recent success of reinforcement learning (RL) in solving complex tasks is often attributed to its capacity to explore and exploit an environment.', 'ro': 'Succesul recent al învățării de consolidare (RL) în rezolvarea sarcinilor complexe este adesea atribuit capacității sale de a explora și exploata un mediu.', 'mt': 'Is-suċċess reċenti tat-tagħlim rinfurzat (RL) fis-soluzzjoni ta’ kompiti kumplessi ta’ spiss huwa attribwit għall-kapaċità tiegħu li jesplora u jisfrutta ambjent.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешниот успех на зајакнувањето на учењето (РЛ) во решавањето на комплексните задачи честопати се припишува на неговиот капацитет за истражување и искористување на околината.', 'sr': 'Nedavni uspeh učenja pojačanja (RL) u rješavanju kompleksnih zadataka često se odnosi na njen kapacitet da istraži i iskoristi okoliš.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්ණ වැඩක් විස්තර කරන්න සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සමහර විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි', 'sv': 'Den senaste tidens framgångar med förstärkt lärande (RL) när det gäller att lösa komplexa uppgifter tillskrivs ofta dess förmåga att utforska och utnyttja en miljö.', 'ta': 'The recent success of reinforcement learning (RL) in solving complex tasks is often attributed to its capacity to explore and exploit an environment.', 'so': 'Muddo badan waxaa ku saabsan awooddiisa ku baaraandegista iyo isticmaalka deegaanka.', 'ur': 'پیچیدہ کاموں کو حل کرنے کے لئے اچھی موفقیت کی مضبوط تعلیم (RL) کی سفارش بہت سی وقت اس کی قابلیت کے ساتھ ایک محیط محیط کا تحقیق اور استعمال کرنا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Sự thành công gần đây của việc củng cố học tập (RL) trong việc giải quyết các nhiệm vụ phức tạp thường được cho là khả năng khám phá và khai thác môi trường.', 'uz': 'The recent success of reinforcement learning (RL) in solving complex tasks is often attributed to its capacity to explore and exploit an environment.', 'bg': 'Наскорошният успех на усилващото обучение (РС) при решаването на сложни задачи често се дължи на способността му да изследва и експлоатира дадена среда.', 'da': 'Den nylige succes med forstærkningslæring (RL) med at løse komplekse opgaver skyldes ofte dens evne til at udforske og udnytte et miljø.', 'hr': 'Nedavni uspjeh učenja pojačanja (RL) u rješavanju kompleksnih zadataka često se odnosi na svoj kapacitet istraživanja i iskoristavanja okoliša.', 'nl': 'Het recente succes van versterking learning (RL) bij het oplossen van complexe taken wordt vaak toegeschreven aan het vermogen om een omgeving te verkennen en te exploiteren.', 'de': 'Der jüngste Erfolg von Reinforcement Learning (RL) bei der Lösung komplexer Aufgaben wird oft auf seine Fähigkeit zurückgeführt, eine Umgebung zu erkunden und zu nutzen.', 'fa': 'موفقیت اخیر از یادگیری افزایش (RL) در حل کارهای پیچیده اغلب به توانایی آن برای کشف و استفاده از محیط محیط تعریف می\u200cشود.', 'id': 'Sukses belakangan ini dari pemerintahan belajar (RL) dalam memecahkan tugas kompleks sering ditanggung oleh kapasitas untuk mengeksplorasi dan mengeksplorasi lingkungan.', 'ko': '강화학습(RL)이 최근 복잡한 임무를 해결하는 데 성공한 것은 통상적으로 환경을 탐색하고 이용하는 능력 덕분이다.', 'sw': 'mafanikio ya hivi karibuni ya kuuza elimu (RL) katika kutatua kazi ngumu mara nyingi yanasababishwa na uwezo wake wa kutafuta na kutumia mazingira.', 'tr': 'Karmaşık zadlary çözmekde soňky öwrenmeleriň (RL) köpüräk ukyplaryny açmak we ulanmak ukyplaryna golaýlaýar.', 'af': "Die onlangse sukses van versterking leer (RL) in die oplossing van komplekse taak is dikwels aan sy kapasiteit toegewys om 'n omgewing te ondersoek en te exploit.", 'am': 'የቀኑ የፀሐይ ትምህርት ማድረግ (RL) በተጨማሪው ስራ ለመፍታት ብዙ ጊዜም አካባቢውን ለመመርመርና ለመጠቀም ስልጣን ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Müxtəlif işləri çəkmək üçün yeni öyrənmək öyrənməsinin (RL) müvəffəqiyyəti çox çox səbəb bir ortamı keşfetmək və istifadə etmək bacarılığına nəsib edilir.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক কাজের শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধি প্রদানের (আরএল) সমাধানের সমাধানের সাফল্য প্রায়শই পরিবেশ খুঁজে বের করা এবং ব্যবহার করার ক্ষমতার ক', 'bs': 'Nedavni uspjeh učenja pojačanja (RL) u rješavanju kompleksnih zadataka često se odnosi na svoj kapacitet istraživanja i iskoristavanja okoliša.', 'ca': "L'èxit recent de l'aprenentatge de reforç (RL) en resoldre tasques complexes sovint està atribuit a la seva capacitat d'explorar i explotar un entorn.", 'sq': 'Suksesi i fundit i forcimit të mësimit (RL) në zgjidhjen e detyrave komplekse shpesh i atribuohet aftësisë së tij për të eksploruar dhe shfrytëzuar një mjedis.', 'cs': 'Nedávný úspěch zesílení učení (RL) při řešení složitých úkolů je často připisován jeho schopnosti prozkoumat a využívat prostředí.', 'et': 'Hiljutine edu tugevdamise õppes keerukate ülesannete lahendamisel on sageli omistatud selle suutlikkusele uurida ja kasutada keskkonda.', 'hy': 'Հետագայում բարդ խնդիրների լուծման ընթացքում ուսուցման ուժեղացման հաջողությունը հաճախ պատասխանում է միջավայրի ուսումնասիրելու և օգտագործելու ունակությանը:', 'fi': 'Vahvistusoppimisen viimeaikainen menestys monimutkaisten tehtävien ratkaisemisessa johtuu usein sen kyvystä tutkia ja hyödyntää ympäristöä.', 'ha': "Ga dawwama na ƙari da za'a ƙara wa kujifunza (RL) a cikin solar aikin masu adadi, ko da yawa ana ƙayyade abincinsa dõmin ya nẽmi ko isticmbuwa a mazaɓa.", 'he': 'ההצלחה האחרונה של לימוד התגבורה (RL) בפתרון משימות מורכבות לעתים קרובות מונחת ליכולתו לחקור ולניצל סביבה.', 'sk': 'Nedavni uspeh okrepitvenega učenja pri reševanju kompleksnih nalog je pogosto pripisan njegovi sposobnosti raziskovanja in izkoriščanja okolja.', 'jv': '(RL)', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་གསོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱས་ཆེན་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལཱ་གཡོན་ཚད་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ཤིག་ནི་རྒྱས་ཐལ་ཡོད་པ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན'}
{'en': 'Prompt-Based Rule Discovery and Boosting for Interactive Weakly-Supervised Learning', 'ar': 'UniTranSeR: إطار التمثيل الدلالي الموحد للمحول لنظام حوار متعدد الوسائط متعدد المهام', 'fr': 'UniTranser\xa0: Un cadre de représentation sémantique unifié des transformateurs pour un système de dialogue multimodal orienté tâche', 'es': 'UniTranser: un marco unificado de representación semántica de transformadores para un sistema de diálogo multimodal orientado a tareas', 'pt': 'UniTranSeR: uma estrutura de representação semântica de transformador unificada para sistema de diálogo orientado a tarefas multimodal', 'ja': 'UniTranSeR ：マルチモーダルタスク指向ダイアログシステムのための統合変圧器セマンティック表現フレームワーク', 'zh': 'UniTranSeR:多式,框架变压器语义', 'hi': 'UniTranSeR: मल्टीमॉडल कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणाली के लिए एक एकीकृत ट्रांसफॉर्मर सिमेंटिक प्रतिनिधित्व फ्रेमवर्क', 'ru': 'UniTranSeR: единая структура семантического представления трансформаторов для мультимодальной системы диалога, ориентированной на решение конкретных задач', 'ga': 'UniTranSeR: Creat Léirithe Shéimeantach Aontuithe Trasfhoirmeora le haghaidh Córas Dialóige Ilmhódach Dírithe ar Thasc', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα ενοποιημένο πλαίσιο σημασιολογικής αναπαράστασης μετασχηματιστή για το πολυμοπικό σύστημα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένο στην εργασία', 'hu': 'UniTranSeR: Egységes transzformátor szemantikus reprezentációs keretrendszer multimodális feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerhez', 'it': 'UniTranSeR: un quadro unificato di rappresentazione semantica dei trasformatori per il sistema di dialogo multimodale orientato alle attività', 'lt': 'UniTranSeR: Bendra daugiarūšio dialogo, orientuoto į užduotis, Semantinės perdavimo sistema', 'kk': 'UniTranSeR: КөпModal Тапсырмалар бағытталған диалог үшін біріктірілген түрлендіруші семантикалық түрлендіруші фрейміName', 'mk': 'UniTranSeR: Унифицирана семантичка рамка за трансформирање за семантична претстава за систем на мултимодилен дијалог ориентиран на задачи', 'ms': 'UniTranSeR: Sebuah Sistem Perwakilan Semantik Transformer Bersatu untuk Dialog Berorientasi Tugas Berberbilang', 'ml': 'യൂണിട്രാന്\u200dസെര്\u200d: ഒരു യൂണിക്കപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെമ്യൂര്\u200dക്ക്: Multimodal Task- Oriented Dialog', 'mt': "UniTranSeR: Qafas Unifikat ta' Rappreżentanza Semantika tat-Trasformatori għal Djalogu Multimodali orjentat lejn ix-Xogħol", 'mn': 'UniTranSeR: Олон-моделийн ажлын ориентиролтын диалогын төлөө нэгтгэл шилжүүлэгч Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog ;System', 'no': 'UniTranSeR: Eit unisert transformeringssemiantisk representeringsrammeverk for multimodal oppgåveorientert dialogvindauge', 'pl': 'UniTranSeR: Unified Transformer Semantyczne Framework Reprezentacji dla multimodalnego systemu dialogu zorientowanego na zadania', 'ro': 'UniTranSeR: Un cadru unificat de reprezentare semantică a transformatorului pentru sistemul de dialog multimodal orientat spre sarcini', 'sr': 'UniTranSeR: Semantički predstavnik jednostavnog transformera za multimodalni dijalog orijentiranog zadatka', 'si': 'UniTranSeR: ගොඩමෝඩාල් වැඩ- ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවාදය සඳහා සමාන්තික ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන සංවාදය', 'so': 'UniTranSeR: A Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog', 'sv': 'UniTranSeR: Ett enhetligt transformatorsystem för semantisk representation för multimodalt uppgiftsorienterat dialogsystem', 'ta': 'ஒரு பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'UniTranSeR: Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog کے لئے ایک یونیفڈ ترنسفور سیمنٹی ریسپینسٹ\u200cशन فرارمورک', 'uz': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'vi': 'UniTranSeR: A Uniced transformer Semantic Representation frame for multichuyển al Task-Orient DiaLượng System', 'bg': 'Унифицирана рамка за семантично представяне на трансформатора за мултимодална система за диалог, ориентирана към задачите', 'hr': 'UniTranSeR: Semantički okvir predstavljanja jednostavnog transformera za multimodalni dijalog orijentiranog na zadatke', 'nl': 'UniTranSeR: Een Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework voor multimodaal taakgericht dialoogsysteem', 'da': 'UniTranSeR: En Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Opgaveorienteret Dialogsystem', 'de': 'UniTranSeR: Ein Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework für multimodales aufgabenorientiertes Dialogsystem', 'ko': 'UnitTranser: 다중모드 작업을 위한 대화 시스템의 통일된 변환기 의미 표시 프레임워크', 'fa': 'سیستم', 'id': 'UniTranSeR: Sebuah Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog System', 'sw': 'R: Mfumo wa Uwekezaji wa Semantic Representation for Multimodal Task-oriented Dialog )System', 'af': "UniTranSeR: ' n Unified Transformer Semantic Representative Raamwerk vir Multimodal Opdrag- Orienteerde Dialoog", 'tr': 'UniTranSeR: A Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog  System', 'sq': 'UniTranSeR: A Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog', 'am': 'R: A Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog', 'hy': 'UniTransmSeR: A UniTED Transforme SEMANC REPOSENCE CAMP for multimodial', 'az': 'UniTranSeR: Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog üçün Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework ;System', 'bn': 'ইউনিট্র্যান্সসএR: মাল্টিমোডাল কাজ- অরিন্তিত ডায়ালগের জন্য একটি একত্রিত পরিবর্তন সেম্যান্ডিক প্রতিনিধি ফ্রেম', 'bs': 'UniTranSeR: Semantički okvir predstavljanja uniformiranog transformatora za multimodalni dijalog orijentiranog na zadatke', 'ca': 'UniTranSeR: Un Cadre Unificat de Representació Semàtica de Transformers per a un Diàleg Multimodal Orientat a Tarefas', 'cs': 'UniTranSeR: Jednotný transformátorový sémantický reprezentační rámec pro multimodální dialogový systém orientovaný na úkoly', 'et': 'UniTranSeR: ühtne transformaatori semantiline esindusraamistik mitmeliigilise ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteemi jaoks', 'fi': 'UniTranSeR: Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework for Multimodal Task-Oriented Dialog System', 'jv': 'UniTranSeR: A Uniified Transformer semanti representation frame for Multimodal task-Oriented Dialog  System', 'sk': 'UniTranSeR: Enotni semantični predstavniški okvir transformatorjev za multimodalni sistem dialoga, usmerjen v naloge', 'he': 'UniTranSeR: מסגר מייצג סמנטי משותף מאוחד עבור מערכת דיאלוג ממוקד משימות רבות', 'ha': 'R: A Unified Transformer Semantic Reposition Frame for mulmodal Tax- originated Dialog > system', 'bo': 'UniTranSeR:སྡུད་འདོམས་པའི་དབྱིབས་ཆ་མཚུངས་པའི་སྡུད་རིམ་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་གནང་བ །མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'Weakly-supervised learning (WSL) has shown promising results in addressing label scarcity on many NLP tasks, but manually designing a comprehensive, high-quality labeling rule set is tedious and difficult. We study interactive weakly-supervised learning—the problem of iteratively and automatically discovering novel labeling rules from data to improve the WSL model. Our proposed model, named PRBoost, achieves this goal via iterative prompt-based rule discovery and model boosting. It uses boosting to identify large-error instances and discovers candidate rules from them by prompting pre-trained LMs with rule templates. The candidate rules are judged by human experts, and the accepted rules are used to generate complementary weak labels and strengthen the current model. Experiments on four tasks show PRBoost outperforms state-of-the-art WSL baselines up to 7.1%, and bridges the gaps with fully supervised models.', 'ar': 'كطريقة تفاعل أكثر طبيعية وذكية ، حظي نظام الحوار متعدد الوسائط الموجه نحو المهام مؤخرًا باهتمام كبير وتم تحقيق العديد من التقدم الملحوظ. ومع ذلك ، فإن جميع الدراسات الحالية تقريبًا تتبع خط الأنابيب لتعلم أولاً الميزات داخل الوسائط بشكل منفصل ثم إجراء تسلسل بسيط للميزات أو دمج الميزات القائمة على الانتباه لتوليد استجابات ، مما يعيقهم من تعلم التفاعلات بين الوسائط وإجراء محاذاة ميزة عبر الوسائط من أجل توليد استجابات أكثر وعيًا بالنية. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقترح UniTranSeR ، وهو إطار التمثيل الدلالي الموحد للمحولات مع محاذاة الميزات والاستدلال النية لأنظمة الحوار متعدد الوسائط. على وجه التحديد ، قمنا أولاً بتضمين الميزات متعددة الوسائط في مساحة دلالية موحدة للمحول لتحفيز التفاعلات بين الوسائط ، ثم نبتكر طبقة محاذاة السمات وطبقة الاستدلال النية (FAIR) لأداء محاذاة الكيان عبر الوسائط والتفكير الدقيق للقيمة الرئيسية ، وذلك لتحديد نية المستخدم بشكل فعال لتوليد ردود أكثر دقة. تتحقق النتائج التجريبية من فعالية UniTranSeR ، مما يدل على أنه يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث الأساليب على مجموعة بيانات MMD التمثيلية.', 'fr': "En tant que moyen d'interaction plus naturel et intelligent, le système de dialogue multimodal axé sur les tâches a récemment reçu une grande attention et de nombreux progrès remarquables ont été réalisés. Néanmoins, presque toutes les études existantes suivent le pipeline pour d'abord apprendre les caractéristiques intra-modales séparément, puis effectuer une simple concaténation d'entités ou une fusion de caractéristiques basée sur l'attention pour générer des réponses, ce qui les empêche d'apprendre les interactions intermodales et de réaliser un alignement de caractéristiques intermodales. pour générer des réponses plus sensibles à l'intention. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons UniTranser, un cadre de représentation sémantique unifiée des transformateurs avec alignement des entités et raisonnement d'intention pour les systèmes de dialogue multimodaux. Plus précisément, nous intégrons d'abord les entités multimodales dans un espace sémantique de Transformer unifié pour provoquer des interactions intermodales, puis nous concevons une couche FAIR (Feature Alignment and Intention Reasoning) pour effectuer un alignement intermodal des entités et un raisonnement clé-valeur précis, afin d'identifier efficacement l'intention de l'utilisateur de générer des réponses plus précises. Les résultats expérimentaux confirment l'efficacité d'UniTranser, montrant qu'il surpasse de manière significative les approches de pointe sur l'ensemble de données MMD représentatif.", 'es': 'Como una forma de interacción más natural e inteligente, el sistema de diálogo multimodal orientado a tareas recientemente ha recibido gran atención y se han logrado muchos avances notables. Sin embargo, casi todos los estudios existentes siguen el proceso para aprender primero las características intramodales por separado y luego realizar una concatenación de características simple o una fusión de características basada en la atención para generar respuestas, lo que les impide aprender interacciones intermodales y llevar a cabo la alineación de características intermodales. para generar respuestas más conscientes de la intención. Para abordar estos problemas, proponemos UniTranser, un marco de Representación Semántica Unificada de Transformadores con alineación de características y razonamiento de intención para sistemas de diálogo multimodales. Específicamente, primero incorporamos las entidades multimodales en un espacio semántico de Transformer unificado para provocar interacciones intermodales, y luego diseñamos una capa de alineación de características y razonamiento de intención (FAIR) para realizar la alineación de entidades intermodales y un razonamiento de clave-valor detallado, a fin de identificar de manera efectiva la intención del usuario de generar respuestas más precisas. Los resultados experimentales verifican la eficacia de UniTranser, lo que demuestra que supera significativamente los enfoques más avanzados en el conjunto de datos representativo de MMD.', 'pt': 'Como uma forma de interação mais natural e inteligente, o sistema de diálogo multimodal orientado a tarefas recentemente recebeu grande atenção e muitos progressos notáveis foram alcançados. No entanto, quase todos os estudos existentes seguem o pipeline para primeiro aprender recursos intramodais separadamente e, em seguida, realizar concatenação de recursos simples ou fusão de recursos baseados em atenção para gerar respostas, o que os impede de aprender interações intermodais e realizar alinhamento de recursos multimodais para gerando respostas mais conscientes da intenção. Para resolver esses problemas, propomos o UniTranSeR, um framework de representação semântica de transformador unificado com alinhamento de recursos e raciocínio de intenção para sistemas de diálogo multimodal. Especificamente, primeiro incorporamos os recursos multimodais em um espaço semântico unificado do Transformer para solicitar interações intermodais e, em seguida, criamos uma camada de alinhamento de recursos e raciocínio de intenção (FAIR) para realizar alinhamento de entidade multimodal e raciocínio de valor-chave refinado, para identificar efetivamente a intenção do usuário em gerar respostas mais precisas. Os resultados experimentais verificam a eficácia do UniTranSeR, mostrando que ele supera significativamente as abordagens de última geração no conjunto de dados MMD representativo.', 'ja': 'より自然でインテリジェントなインタラクション方式として、マルチモーダルタスク指向のダイアログシステムは最近大きな注目を浴び、多くの顕著な進歩を達成しています。  それにもかかわらず、ほぼすべての既存の研究は、まずモーダル内の特徴を個別に学習し、次に単純な特徴の連結または注意に基づく特徴の融合を実行して応答を生成し、それは、より多くの意図を認識する応答を生成するために、モーダル間の相互作用を学習し、クロスモーダル特徴アライメントを実施することを妨げる。 これらの問題に対処するために、UniTranSeRを提案します。Unified Transformer Semantic Representationフレームワークは、マルチモーダルダイアログシステムの機能アライメントと意図推論を備えています。 具体的には、まず、マルチモーダル機能を統一されたTransformerセマンティック空間に埋め込んで、モーダル間の相互作用を促し、次に、より正確な応答を生成するためのユーザーの意図を効果的に識別するために、クロスモーダルエンティティアラインメントと細かいキー値の推論を実行するためのフィーチャーアラインメントとインテント推論（ FAIR ）レイヤーを考案します。  実験結果は、UniTranSeRの有効性を検証し、代表的なMMDデータセットの最先端のアプローチを大幅に上回ることを示しています。', 'zh': '多模导语系统为自然、智能之交互方式,近受高度重视,多所显进。  然凡诸见治皆循管道,先别模态内,然后简合以应之,阻其学模态间相为跨模态齐以生感应。 为此等UniTranSeR,一Transformer语义示框架,多模态对齐意推理。 先销多模态于一Transformer语义之间,以言模态间之交,然后设意推理(FAIR)层来行跨模态实体对齐与细粒度键值推理,以知用户之意,而生确应。  实验验UniTranSeR之有效性,明其有代表性之MMD数集上明优于先进之术也。', 'ru': 'Как более естественный и интеллектуальный способ взаимодействия,  мультимодальная ориентированная на задачи диалоговая система в последнее время получила большое внимание, и был достигнут значительный прогресс.  Тем не менее, почти все существующие исследования следуют конвейеру, чтобы сначала изучить внутримодальные признаки отдельно, а затем провести простую конкатенацию признаков или слияние признаков, основанное на внимании, чтобы   генерировать ответы, что мешает им изучать интермодальные взаимодействия и проводить кросс-модальное выравнивание признаков для генерирования более осознанных ответов. Для решения этих проблем мы предлагаем UniTranSeR, единую структуру семантического представления трансформатора с выравниванием признаков и обоснованием намерений для мультимодальных диалоговых систем. В частности, мы сначала встраиваем мультимодальные признаки в унифицированное семантическое пространство Трансформатора, чтобы стимулировать интермодальные взаимодействия, а затем разрабатываем слой выравнивания признаков и обоснования намерений (FAIR) для выполнения кросс-модального выравнивания сущностей и тонкозернистого обоснования ключевых значений, чтобы эффективно идентифицировать намерение пользователя генерировать более точные ответы.  Экспериментальные результаты подтверждают эффективность UniTranSeR, показывая, что он значительно превосходит современные подходы на репрезентативном наборе данных MMD.', 'hi': 'एक अधिक प्राकृतिक और बुद्धिमान बातचीत के तरीके के रूप में, मल्टीमॉडल कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणाली ने हाल ही में बहुत ध्यान दिया है और कई उल्लेखनीय प्रगति हासिल की गई है।  फिर भी, लगभग सभी मौजूदा अध्ययन पाइपलाइन का पालन करते हैं ताकि पहले इंट्रा-मोडल सुविधाओं को अलग से सीखा जा सके और फिर प्रतिक्रियाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए सरल सुविधा संयोजन या ध्यान-आधारित सुविधा संलयन का संचालन किया जा सके, जो उन्हें इंटर-मोडल इंटरैक्शन सीखने और अधिक इरादे-जागरूक प्रतिक्रियाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए क्रॉस-मोडल फीचर संरेखण का संचालन करने से बाधित करता है। इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम UniTranSeR, एक एकीकृत ट्रांसफॉर्मर सिमेंटिक प्रतिनिधित्व फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें मल्टीमॉडल संवाद प्रणालियों के लिए सुविधा संरेखण और इरादा तर्क होता है। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले इंटर-मोडल इंटरैक्शन को प्रॉम्प्ट करने के लिए एक एकीकृत ट्रांसफॉर्मर सिमेंटिक स्पेस में मल्टीमॉडल विशेषताओं को एम्बेड करते हैं, और फिर क्रॉस-मोडल एंटिटी संरेखण और ठीक-ठाक कुंजी-मूल्य तर्क करने के लिए एक फीचर संरेखण और इरादा तर्क (FAIR) परत तैयार करते हैं, ताकि अधिक सटीक प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करने के लिए उपयोगकर्ता के इरादे को प्रभावी ढंग से पहचाना जा सके।  प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम UniTranSeR की प्रभावशीलता को सत्यापित करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि यह प्रतिनिधि एमएमडी डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ga': 'Mar bhealach idirghníomhaíochta níos nádúrtha agus níos cliste, tugadh aird mhór le déanaí ar chóras dialóige ilmhódach atá dírithe ar thascanna agus tá go leor dul chun cinn suntasach déanta. Mar sin féin, leanann beagnach gach staidéar reatha an phíblíne chun gnéithe inmhódúla a fhoghlaim ar leithligh ar dtús agus ansin comhtháthaíonn gné shimplí nó comhleá gnéithe aird-bhunaithe a dhéanamh chun freagairtí a ghiniúint, a chuireann bac orthu ó bheith ag foghlaim idirghníomhaíochtaí idirmhódúla agus ag déanamh ailíniú gnéithe trasmhódúla le haghaidh. freagairtí níos feasach ar intinn a ghiniúint. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na saincheisteanna seo, molaimid UniTranSeR, creat Aontuithe um Ionadaíocht Shéimeantach Trasfhoirmeora le ailíniú gné agus réasúnaíocht intinne do chórais dialóige ilmhódacha. Go sonrach, déanaimid na gnéithe ilmhódacha a leabú ar dtús i spás shéimeantach aontaithe Trasfhoirmeoir chun idirghníomhaíochtaí idirmhódacha a spreagadh, agus ansin ciseal ailíniú gné agus réasúnaíocht intinne (FAIR) a cheapadh chun ailíniú aonáin trasmhódúil agus réasúnaíocht eochairluacha mhínghlan a dhéanamh, ionas go n-aithneofar go héifeachtach rún an úsáideora maidir le freagraí níos cruinne a ghiniúint. Deimhníonn torthaí turgnamhacha éifeachtacht UniTranSeR, ag taispeáint go sáraíonn sé cur chuige úrscothach maidir leis an tacar sonraí ionadaíoch MMD.', 'hu': 'Természetesebb és intelligens interakciós módszerként a multimodális feladatorientált párbeszédrendszer a közelmúltban nagy figyelmet kapott és sok figyelemre méltó előrelépés történt. Mindazonáltal szinte minden meglévő tanulmány követi az intramodális jellemzők elsajátítását külön-külön, majd egyszerű jellemzők összekapcsolását vagy figyelem-alapú jellemzők fúzióját a válaszok előállítása érdekében, ami akadályozza őket abban, hogy megtanulják az intermodális kölcsönhatásokat és transmodális jellemzők összehangolását a szándék-tudatos válaszok előállítása érdekében. E problémák megoldásához javasoljuk az UniTranSeR-t, egy Unified Transformer Szemantikus Representation keretrendszert, amely funkcióigazítást és szándékos érvelést biztosít multimodális párbeszédrendszerek számára. Konkrétan, először egy egységes transzformátor szemantikai térbe ágyazzuk a multimodális funkciókat, hogy elősegítsük az intermodális interakciókat, majd kidolgozzuk a funkcióigazítási és szándékozási érvelési réteget (FAIR) a multimodális entitások összehangolására és a finomszemcsés kulcsértékek érvelésére, hogy hatékonyan azonosítsuk a felhasználó szándékát a pontosabb válaszok generálására. Kísérleti eredmények igazolják az UniTranSeR hatékonyságát, ami azt mutatja, hogy jelentősen felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb megközelítéseket a reprezentatív MMD adatkészleten.', 'el': "Ως ένας πιο φυσικός και ευφυής τρόπος αλληλεπίδρασης, το πολυπροπικό σύστημα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένο στις εργασίες έχει λάβει πρόσφατα μεγάλη προσοχή και έχουν επιτευχθεί πολλές αξιόλογες εξελίξεις. Παρ 'όλα αυτά, σχεδόν όλες οι υπάρχουσες μελέτες ακολουθούν τον αγωγό για να μάθουν πρώτα τα ενδοmodale χαρακτηριστικά ξεχωριστά και στη συνέχεια να διεξάγουν απλή συσχέτιση χαρακτηριστικών ή συγχώνευση χαρακτηριστικών με βάση την προσοχή για να δημιουργήσουν απαντήσεις, γεγονός που τους εμποδίζει να μάθουν τις διαπmodale αλληλεπιδράσεις και να διεξάγουν ευθυγράμμιση χαρακτηριστικών με σκοπό τη δημιουργία πιο συνειδητών απαντήσεων. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, προτείνουμε ένα ενοποιημένο πλαίσιο σημασιολογικής αναπαράστασης μετασχηματιστή με ευθυγράμμιση χαρακτηριστικών και συλλογιστική προθέσεων για πολυμορφικά συστήματα διαλόγου. Συγκεκριμένα, ενσωματώνουμε πρώτα τα πολυμορφικά χαρακτηριστικά σε έναν ενοποιημένο σημασιολογικό χώρο μετασχηματιστή για να προτρέψουμε τις διεπροπικές αλληλεπιδράσεις, και στη συνέχεια σχεδιάζουμε ένα στρώμα ευθυγράμμισης χαρακτηριστικών και συλλογισμού προθέσεων (για να εκτελέσουμε τη διαστροπική ευθυγράμμιση οντοτήτων και τη λεπτόκοκκη συλλογιστική βασικής αξίας, έτσι ώστε να προσδιορίσουμε αποτελεσματικά την πρόθεση του χρήστη για τη δημιουργία ακριβέστερων απαντήσεων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα επαληθεύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του UniTranSeR, δείχνοντας ότι ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις στο αντιπροσωπευτικό σύνολο δεδομένων MMD.", 'ka': 'როგორც უფრო ნაირთვის და ინტელექტიური ინტერფექციაციის გზა, მულიმედიალური დავალების დიალოგის სისტემა აღმოჩენა დიდი ინტერფექცია და მრავალური პროგრესები მოქმე მაგრამ, უფრო ყველა მსგავსი სწავლის გადასწავლობა, რომელიც პირველი მოდიალური ფუნქციების გადასწავლობა განსაკუთრებულად და შემდეგ უფრო მარტივი ფუნქციების გადასწავლობა ან აღმოჩენებული ფუნქციების ფუნქციის ფუნქციის ფუნქციის გადასწავლობა “  ამ პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ UniTranSeR-ს, ერთადერთებული ტრანფიგურაციის Semantic Representative ფრამეტრის, რომელიც ფუნქციების დასწორება და მინდომის პარამენტი მულტიმოდიალური დიალო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ პირველად მლიტიმოდიალური ფუნქციები ერთადერთად ტრანფორმეტრის სიმენტიკური ადგილაში დავყენებთ, რომ შემდეგ მოდიალური ინტერფექციების შესაძლებლობა, და შემდეგ განსაკუთრება ფუნქციების განსაკუთრება და მინდომის განსაკუთრება (FAIR) ადგილას გავაკეთებთ კრე ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები განაკეთებენ UniTranSeR ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ის მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო გავაკეთებენ მონაცემენტის მონაცემენტის მონაცე', 'it': "Come modo di interazione più naturale e intelligente, il sistema di dialogo multimodale orientato ai compiti ha recentemente ricevuto grande attenzione e molti progressi notevoli sono stati raggiunti. Tuttavia, quasi tutti gli studi esistenti seguono la pipeline per prima cosa imparare le caratteristiche intramodali separatamente e poi condurre una semplice concatenazione delle caratteristiche o fusione delle caratteristiche basata sull'attenzione per generare risposte, che impedisce loro di imparare le interazioni intermodali e condurre l'allineamento delle caratteristiche cross-modali per generare risposte più consapevoli delle intenzioni. Per affrontare questi problemi, proponiamo UniTranSeR, un framework Unified Transformer Semantic Representation con allineamento delle funzionalità e ragionamento delle intenzioni per sistemi di dialogo multimodali. Nello specifico, prima incorporamo le funzionalità multimodali in uno spazio semantico unificato di Transformer per sollecitare interazioni intermodali, poi elaboriamo un livello FAIR (Feature Alignment and Intention Rating) per eseguire allineamento di entità cross-modali e ragionamento chiave-valore a grana fine, in modo da identificare efficacemente l'intenzione dell'utente di generare risposte più accurate. I risultati sperimentali verificano l'efficacia di UniTranSeR, dimostrando che supera significativamente gli approcci all'avanguardia sul set di dati MMD rappresentativo.", 'kk': 'Табиғи және интерфейс арқылы көптеген, көптеген тапсырмалар бағытталған диалог жүйесі жақында көптеген болды және көптеген өзгерістер жеткізілді. Әйтпесе, барлық зерттеулері бірінші модалдық мүмкіндіктерді бір-бірінен үйрену үшін қарапайым мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру немесе қарапайым мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру үшін қарапайым мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру немесе қарапайым негізделген мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру үшін қарапайым жауаптарды Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін біріктірілген түрлендіруші семантикалық түрлендіруші бағдарламасының UniTranSeR- ын, көпModal диалог жүйелерінің қасиеттерді түрлендіру және мақсаттау ү Ескерту үшін бірінші көптеген мүмкіндіктерді біріктірілген түрлендіруші семантикалық орынға ендіріп, медиалдық интерфейстерді сұрау үшін, кейін бірнеше модалдық нысандарды түрлендіру және түрлендіру үшін (FAIR) қабатты түрлендіру және кілттерді түрлендіру үшін, пайдаланушының дұр Эксперименталдық нәтижелері UniTranSeR дегеннің эффектілігін тексеріп, ол MMD деректер жиынының күй- жайындағы күй- жайындағы күй- жайындағы күй- жайын өзгертіп тұрады.', 'lt': 'Kaip natūralesnis ir protingesnis sąveikos būdas, neseniai daugiarūšio dialogo sistema, orientuota į užduotis, buvo labai daug dėmesio skiriama ir pasiekta daug pastebimų pažangų. Vis dėlto beveik visi esami tyrimai atliekami siekiant iš pradžių atskirai išmokti transporto priemonių savybes, o po to atlikti paprastą jungiamąją funkciją arba dėmesio pagrindu grindžiamą jungiamąją funkciją, kad „ būtų sukurti atsakai, trukdantys jiems mokytis tarptransporto sąveikos ir atlikti „ tarptransporto savybių suderinimą “ siekiant sukurti labiau sąmoningas atsakas. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos klausimus, siūlome UniTranSeR, vieningą transformuojančios Semantinės atstovavimo sistemą, kurioje būtų suderintos savybės ir pagrįstos daugiarūšio dialogo sistemos. Konkrečiai, pirmiausia įterpėme daugiarūšio transporto charakteristikas į vieningą semantinę Transformuotojo erdvę, kad paskatintume tarpmodalinę s ąveiką, o vėliau sukurtume savybių suderinimo ir ketinimo pagrįstumo (FAIR) sluoksnį, kad būtų atliktas įvairiarūšio transporto subjekto suderinimas ir tikslesnis pagrindinių vertybių pagrįstumas, siekiant veiksmingai nustatyti naudotojo ketinimą sukurti tikslesnius atsakymus. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai tikrina UniTranSeR veiksmingumą ir rodo, kad jis gerokai viršija naujausius metodus reprezentatyvio MMD duomenų rinkinio atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Како поприроден и интелигентен начин на интеракција, мултимодилниот дијалог систем кој е ориентиран на задачите неодамна доби големо внимание и многу извонредни напредоци се постигнати. Сепак, скоро сите постоечки студии го следат нафтоводот за прво да ги научат интермодалните карактеристики одделно и потоа да спроведат едноставна концентрација на карактеристики или фоузија на карактеристики базирани на внимание за „ да генерираат одговори, што ги попречува од учењето на интермодалните интеракции и спроведуваоето „ крстомодално приспособување на To address these issues, we propose UniTranSeR, a Unified Transformer Semantic Representation framework with feature alignment and intention reasoning for multimodal dialog systems.  Специфично, прво ги вклучивме мултимодилните карактеристики во единствениот семантичен простор Трансформер за да поттикнеме интермодални интеракции, а потоа да создадеме слој на прилагодување на карактеристиките и размислување за намерата (FAIR) за да извршиме крстомодално прилагодување на ентитетите и фино прилагодување за клучната вредност, со цел ефикасно да ја идентификува Experimental results verify the effectiveness of UniTranSeR, showing that it significantly outperforms state-of-the-art approaches on the representative MMD dataset.', 'ms': 'Sebagai cara interaksi yang lebih alami dan bijak, sistem dialog berbilang modal yang orient tugas baru-baru ini telah menerima perhatian yang besar dan banyak kemajuan yang luar biasa telah dicapai. Namun, hampir semua kajian yang wujud mengikut saluran paip untuk pertama belajar ciri-ciri intra modal secara terpisah dan kemudian melaksanakan konatenasi ciri sederhana atau fusion ciri-ciri berdasarkan perhatian untuk \u200b\u200bmenghasilkan respon, yang menghalangi mereka dari belajar interaksi antar-modal dan melaksanakan \u200b\u200bpenyesuaian ciri-ciri transmodal untuk menghasilkan respon yang lebih berniat-sedar. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami cadangkan UniTranSeR, kerangka Perwakilan Semantik Transformer Bersatu dengan penyesuaian ciri-ciri dan alasan niat untuk sistem dialog berbilang modal. Secara khusus, kita pertama-tama memasukkan ciri-ciri multimodal ke dalam ruang semantik Transformer bersatu untuk meminta interaksi antar-modal, dan kemudian merancang penyesuaian ciri-ciri dan rancangan niat (FAIR) lapisan untuk melakukan penyesuaian entiti melintasi-modal dan rancangan nilai-kunci yang sempurna, untuk mengenalpasti dengan efektif niat pengguna untuk menghasilkan balasan yang lebih tepat. Keputusan eksperimental mengesahkan keefektivitas UniTranSeR, menunjukkan bahawa ia jauh melebihi pendekatan state-of-the-art pada set data MMD mewakili.', 'mt': 'Bħala mod ta’ interazzjoni aktar naturali u intelliġenti, reċentement is-sistema ta’ djalogu multimodali orjentata lejn ix-xogħol irċeviet attenzjoni kbira u nkisbu ħafna progress notevoli. Madankollu, kważi l-istudji eżistenti kollha jsegwu l-pipeline biex l-ewwel jitgħallmu l-karatteristiċi intramodali separatament u mbagħad iwettqu konċentrazzjoni sempliċi tal-karatteristiċi jew fużjoni tal-karatteristiċi bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni biex “ jiġġeneraw reazzjonijiet, li jfixkluhom milli jitgħallmu interazzjonijiet inter-modali u jwettqu “ allinjament tal-karatteristiċi transmodali “ biex jiġġeneraw reazzjonijiet aktar konxji tal-intenzjoni. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, nipproponu UniTranSeR, qafas Unifikat ta’ Rappreżentanza Semantika Transformatorja b’allinjament tal-karatteristiċi u raġunament tal-intenzjoni għal sistemi ta’ djalogu multimodali. Speċifikament, l-ewwel a ħna inkorporajna l-karatteristiċi multimodali fi spazju semantiku tat-Trasformer unifikat biex inħeġġu l-interazzjonijiet intermodali, u mbagħad infasslu saff ta’ allinjament tal-karatteristiċi u raġunament tal-intenzjoni (FAIR) biex iwettqu allinjament tal-entità transmodali u raġunament tal-valur ewlieni b’għeneb fin, sabiex b’mod effettiv nidentifikaw l-intenzjoni tal-utent li jiġġenera risposti aktar preċiżi Ir-riżultati sperimentali jivverifikaw l-effettività ta’ UniTranSeR, u juru li dan iwassal b’mod sinifikanti għal approċċi l-aktar avvanzati fuq is-sett ta’ dejta rappreżentattiv tal-MMD.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായും ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഇടപാടുകളുടെ രീതിയായിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d, അടുത്തുതന്നെ പലതിലുള്ള ജോലിയുടെ മാര്\u200dഗ എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള എല്ലാ പഠനങ്ങളും പൈപ്പെലൈന്\u200d പിന്തുടരുക ആദ്യം വ്യത്യസ്തമായി വിശേഷിക്കാന്\u200d പിന്തുടരുക, പിന്നീട് എളുപ്പമുള്ള വിശേഷത്തിന്റെ ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുക അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, യൂണിട്രാന്\u200dസെര്\u200dആര്\u200d, ഒരു യൂണിക്കന്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാന്\u200dസ് സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഫ്രെയ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യം പലിമോഡല്\u200d ഗുണഗണങ്ങളെ ഒരു യൂണിക്ക് ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാന്\u200dഡ് സെമാന്\u200dറിക് സ്പെയിസ്റ്റ് ആക്ഷത്തിലേക്ക് കയറ്റിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. പിന്നീട് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്യമായ ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന Experimental results verify the effectiveness of UniTranSeR, showing that it significantly outperforms state-of-the-art approaches on the representative MMD dataset.', 'pl': 'Jako bardziej naturalny i inteligentny sposób interakcji, multimodalny ukierunkowany na zadania system dialogu zyskał ostatnio dużą uwagę i osiągnięto wiele niezwykłych postępów. Niemniej jednak prawie wszystkie istniejące badania podążają za rurociągiem, aby najpierw nauczyć się cech intramodalnych oddzielnie, a następnie przeprowadzić proste łączenie cech lub fuzję cech opartą na uwadze w celu generowania odpowiedzi, co utrudnia im uczenie się interakcji intermodalnych i przeprowadzenie dostosowania cech międzymodalnych w celu generowania bardziej świadomych odpowiedzi. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy UniTranSeR, Unified Transformer Semantic Representation framework z dostosowaniem funkcji i rozumowaniem intencji dla multimodalnych systemów dialogowych. W szczególności, najpierw osadzamy funkcje multimodalne w ujednoliconej przestrzeni semantycznej Transformera, aby wywołać interakcje intermodalne, a następnie opracowujemy warstwę wyrównania funkcji i rozumowania intencji (FAIR), aby wykonać wyrównanie jednostek crossmodalnych i precyzyjne rozumowanie wartości kluczowej, aby skutecznie zidentyfikować intencję użytkownika do generowania bardziej dokładnych odpowiedzi. Wyniki eksperymentalne weryfikują skuteczność UniTranSeR, pokazując, że znacząco przewyższa najnowocześniejsze podejścia na reprezentatywnym zbiorze danych MMD.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн болон ухаантай харилцааны арга хэлбэрээр олон төрлийн ажлын ориентиролт диалог систем саяхан маш их анхаарал авсан бөгөөд маш олон гайхамшигт хөгжлийн үр дүнд гарч ирсэн. Гэвч бараг бүх суурилсан судалгаанууд хоолойн шугам дээр анхны дотор модалын өөрчлөлт суралцаж, дараа нь энгийн өөрчлөлт, анхаарлын төвөгтэй төвөгтэй төвөгтэй төвөгтэй хариултыг үүсгэнэ. Энэ нь тэднийг дотор модалын харилцааныг суралцахаас, олон модалын төвөгтэй харилцааны тусламжтайгаар зогсоож, илүү Эдгээр асуудлуудыг зохицуулахын тулд бид UniTranSeR, нэгдсэн Төрвөлжүүлэгч Semantic Representation Framework, олон моделийн диалог системийн төлөвлөгөө болон зорилготой зорилготой талаар санал өгдөг. Ялангуяа, бид анх олон моделийн бэрхшээлийг нэгтгэх Трансформатчийн семантик орон зайд нэгтгэх боломжтой харилцааныг бууруулахын тулд, дараа нь хэрэглэгчдийн зөв хариулт үүсгэх зорилго болон зорилго зорилго (FAIR) давхар загварыг хийх боломжтой загварын тулд олон моделийн бэрхшээл болон түлхүүр утгын Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд UniTranSeR-ын үр дүнг шалгаж байна. Энэ нь MMD өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд урлагийн тухай байдлын тухай үнэхээр үр дүнтэй байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Som ein meir naturleg og intelligent interaksjonssystem, har det nyleg fått stor oppmerksomhetssystem med fleire oppgåver og mange merkelige framgangar. Men nesten alle eksisterande studiane følgjer rørslinja for å først lære intra-modal funksjonar separe og så gjera enkelt funksjonssammenlikning eller oppmerksbasert funksjonsfusjon til “ laga svar”, som hindrar dei frå læring av intermodal samarbeid og gjera « krysmodal funksjonsjustering » for å laga fleire tilsvar med hjelp. For å handtera desse problema, foreslår vi UniTranSeR, eit unified Transformer Semantic Representative rammeverk med funksjonsjustering og forståelse for multimodal dialogsystemar. Spesifisert innebyr vi først multimodale funksjonane i eit samtidig semantisk plass for å spørja mellommodale interoperasjonar, og s å finn eit funksjonsjustering og forslag (FAIR) for å utføra krysmodal entitetsjustering og justering av nøkkelverdiar, slik at du effektivt identifiserer brukaren til å laga meir nøyaktige svar. Eksperimentale resultat kontrollerer effektiviteten av UniTranSeR, som viser at det betydelig utfører tilnærmingar av kunsten på den representanten MMD-datasettet.', 'so': "As a more natural and intelligent interaction manner,  multimodal task-oriented dialog system recently has received great attention and many remarkable progresses have been achieved.   Si kastaba ha ahaatee, ugu dhowaan waxbarashada joogta oo dhan waxay raacaan baaritaanka si aad ugu horeyso u barto xor-qaab ah, kadibna ay u sameyso qalabka fudud ama fudud oo aad u jeedo, taasoo ka dhibaataysa in ay ka barto iskuul-xiriir-dhexe ah iyo sameynta isbedelka faa'iido ah, si uu u sameeyo jawaabo aad u yaqaan. Si aan u qabsado arimahan, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa UniTranSeR, kaas oo ah kooxa isbedelka midowga ah oo ku qoran qoraalka kala duduwan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ugu horraynay goob kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, si aan u dhaqsiino wadamo kala duduwan, kadibna waxaynu u sameynnay sawirid iyo qasab qalabka qaabilsan, si aan u sameyno sawirida dhamaanka jidhka koronta iyo qiimeynta qiimeynta si fiican, si aan u caddeyno waxyaabaha uu isticmaalaha u sameeyo jawaabaha saxda ah. Imtixaanka waxaa ka xaqiijinaya shaqada UniTranSeR, waxayna caddaysaa inay si muhiim ah u soo bandhigto xiliga farshaxanka ee wakiilka macluumaadka MMD.", 'ro': 'Ca o modalitate de interacțiune mai naturală și mai inteligentă, sistemul de dialog multimodal orientat spre sarcini a primit recent o atenție deosebită și au fost realizate multe progrese remarcabile. Cu toate acestea, aproape toate studiile existente urmează calea de a învăța mai întâi caracteristicile intramodale separat și apoi să efectueze concatenarea simplă a caracteristicilor sau fuziunea caracteristicilor bazată pe atenție pentru a genera răspunsuri, ceea ce le împiedică să învețe interacțiunile intermodale și să efectueze alinierea caracteristicilor transmodale pentru a genera răspunsuri mai conștiente de intenție. Pentru a aborda aceste probleme, propunem UniTranSeR, un cadru de reprezentare semantică unificată a transformatorului cu aliniere a caracteristicilor și raționament de intenție pentru sistemele de dialog multimodal. Mai exact, încorporăm mai întâi caracteristicile multimodale într-un spațiu semantic unificat al Transformerului pentru a solicita interacțiuni intermodale, apoi concepem un strat de aliniere a caracteristicilor și raționament de intenție (FAIR) pentru a efectua alinierea entităților cross-modale și raționament de valoare-cheie fină, astfel încât să identificăm în mod eficient intenția utilizatorului de a genera răspunsuri mai precise. Rezultatele experimentale verifică eficacitatea UniTranSeR, arătând că depășește semnificativ abordările de ultimă oră pe setul de date MMD reprezentativ.', 'sr': 'Kao prirodniji i inteligentniji način interakcije, multimodalni dijalogski sistem usmjeren na zadatke nedavno je dobio veliku pažnju i ostvaren je mnogi izvanredni napredak. Međutim, skoro sve postojeće studije prate cijevi kako bi prvo naučili intra modalne funkcije odvojeno i onda proveli jednostavnu kombinaciju osobina koja su osnovana na pozornosti ili osnovana na pažnji kombinaciju odgovora na „stvaraju odgovore, koji ih ometaju od učenja međumodalnih interakcija i provođenja „krsnomodalnih prilagodba“ za stvaranje više odgovora na namjeru. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predlažemo UniTranSeR, jedan semantički okvir predstavljanja transformera sa opcija usklađenja i namjerama za multimodalne dijalogske sisteme. Posebno, prvo uključujemo multimodalne karakteristike u ujedinjeno semantičko prostor transformera da bi promenili intermodalne interakcije, a zatim smislili sloj pripravnosti i razmatranja namjere (FAIR) da bi izvršili pripravnost krsnomodalnih entiteta i razmatranje ključne vrijednosti, kako bi efikasno identifikovali namjeru korisnika za stvaranje tačnijih odgovora. Eksperimentalni rezultati provjeravaju učinkovitost UniTranSeR, pokazujući da značajno iznosi pristupe države umjetnosti na predstavničkom setu podataka MMD.', 'sv': 'Som ett mer naturligt och intelligent interaktionssätt har det multimodala uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystemet nyligen fått stor uppmärksamhet och många anmärkningsvärda framsteg har gjorts. Trots detta följer nästan alla befintliga studier pipeline för att först lära sig intramodala funktioner separat och sedan genomföra enkel funktionssammankoppling eller uppmärksamhetsbaserad funktionsfusion för att generera svar, vilket hindrar dem från att lära sig intermodala interaktioner och genomföra tvärmodal funktionsanpassning för att generera mer avsiktsmedvetna svar. För att ta itu med dessa frågor föreslår vi UniTranSeR, ett enhetligt transformatorsystem för semantisk representation med funktionsanpassning och intentionsresonemang för multimodala dialogsystem. Specifikt bäddar vi först in de multimodala funktionerna i ett enhetligt Transformer semantiskt utrymme för att uppmana till intermodala interaktioner, och utformar sedan ett funktionsjusterings- och intentionsresonemang (FAIR) lager för att utföra tvärmodal entitetsjustering och finkornigt nyckelvärdesresonemang, för att effektivt identifiera användarens avsikt att generera mer exakta svar. Experimentella resultat verifierar effektiviteten av UniTranSeR, vilket visar att det avsevärt överträffar state-of-the-art metoder på representativa MMD-datauppsättningar.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික සහ බුද්ධිමත් සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් විදියට, ගොඩක් මොඩිමෝඩාල් ව්\u200dයාපාරය සම්බන්ධ සංවාද පද්ධතිය අ නමුත් හැමෝම වෙනුවෙන්, පායිප්ලයින් පළමු ඉගෙන ගන්න සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ විශේෂතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ විශේෂතාවක මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, අපි UniTranSeR ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, Unified Transfer සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂතාවක් සඳහා ගොඩක් මොඩාල්  විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම ගොඩමෝඩල් විශේෂතාවක් එක්කරණ ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් සෙමාන්ටික් තැනට ඇතුළට ඇතුළත් කරන්න, සහ පස්සේ ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් සහ හැකිරීමක් හැකිරීම (FAIR) තැනක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සහ හැකිර පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් UniTranSeR ගේ පරීක්ෂණත්වයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ', 'ta': "அதிக இயற்கையான மற்றும் புதிய இடைவெளியேறும் முறையாக இருந்தால், பல்வேறு செயல்பாடு திருப்பி உரையாடல் அமைப்பு சமீபத்தில் பெரிய கவ இருந்தாலும், கிட்டத்தட்ட அனைத்து தற்போதைய ஆய்வுகளும் முதலில் உள்ளமைப்பு குணங்களை தனியாக கற்று பின்பற்றி பின்பற்றி செயல்படுத்தும் சுலபமான குணங்கள் கூட்டுதல் அல்லது கவனம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள குணங்கள் குறி To address these issues, we propose UniTranSeR, a Unified Transformer Semantic Representation framework with feature alignment and intention reasoning for multimodal dialog systems.  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் முதலில் பல தனிமங்களின் குணங்களை ஒரு unified Transformer semantic space into a unified transient semantic space to prompt inter interactions, and then design a feature alignment and intention reasoning layer to perform cross-modal entity alignment and fine- grained key- value reasons, so effectively identify the user's intention to generate more accurate response. முயற்சி முடிவு", 'ur': 'زیادہ طبیعی اور باهوش تعامل طریقے سے، بہت سی مطابق کی تابع کی تعامل سیسٹم نے اچھے وقت بہت اچھی توجه حاصل کی ہے اور بہت سی اثر اثر اثر حاصل کی گئی ہے۔ However, almost all existing studies follow the pipeline to first learn intra-modal features separately and then conduct simple feature concatenation or attention-based feature fusion to ،generate responses, which hampers them from learning intermodal interactions and conducting ،cross-modal feature alignment ،for generating more intention-aware responses. ان مسائلوں کے بارے میں ہم UniTranSeR کی پیشنهاد کریں گے، ایک یونیفڈ ترنسفور سیمانٹی ریسپانسیٹ ڈرامٹر کے ساتھ فائدہ تضامین اور مشورہ منظورت کے ساتھ ملتی موڈال ڈرایلوگ سیسٹم کے لئے۔ مخصوص طور پر، ہم پہلی بار ایک متغیر متغیر متغیر متغیر متغیر متغیرات کی جگہ میں پیغام دیتے ہیں، اور پھر ایک متغیر متغیر متغیر متغیر متغیر متغیر کرنا اور انتظام متغیر (FAIR) لائر کو تغییر کرنا چاہتے ہیں کہ کروس متغیر متغیر متغیر اور پاکیزہ متغیر کیلوں کے مطابق منصوب کریں، تاکہ اس کے تجربے کے نتائج یونیٹرانس سئر کی فعالیت کی تصدیق کرتی ہیں، جو دکھاتا ہے کہ یہ مثال مثال امڈی ڈیٹسٹ پر موضوعات کی حالت-آرت کے مطابق زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "As a more natural and intelligent interaction manner,  multimodal task-oriented dialog system recently has received great attention and many remarkable progresses have been achieved.   Lekin, qachon hamma mavjud o'qituvchilar birinchi o'rganish uchun birinchi moda xossalarini o'rganish uchun pipelining qidirish va keyin oddiy xususiyatlarni birlashtirish yoki murakkab-asosidagi imkoniyatlarni ishga tushirish imkoniyatlarini yaratish mumkin. Ularni modal interfeys interfeyslarini o'rganishdan foydalanishidan foydalanadi va cross-modal moslamalarini birlashtirishdan foydalanadi va bir qancha Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun UniTranSeR (UniTranSeR) ni tashqarish imkoniyatlari bilan birlashtirish va multimodal dialog tizimlari uchun sabab bo'ladi. Ko'rsatilgan, biz birinchi marta inter-modal interfeys interfeys interfeyslarini ajratish uchun multimodal xususiyatlarni birinchi marta qo'llab qo'yish mumkin, keyin uning moslamalarini tasdiqlash va ma'lumot moslamalarini tasdiqlash uchun qo'llanmalarni aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchining imkoniyatini aniqlash uchun kerak. Name", 'vi': 'Một cách giao tiếp thiên nhiên và thông minh hơn, hệ thống thoại thoại thoại hướng dẫn các thao tác đa chiều gần đây đã nhận được sự chú ý lớn và đã đạt được nhiều tiến bộ đáng chú ý. Tuy nhiên, gần như tất cả các nghiên cứu hiện tại đều theo đường ống để nghiên cứu các tính năng nội các trước tiên và sau đó tiếp tục kết hợp các đặc trưng đơn giản hoặc đặc điểm tập trung để tạo ra phản ứng, cản trở họ học các tương tác nội các và tiến hành sắp xếp các chi tiết khác nhau để tạo ra các phản ứng nhận thức dự đoán. Để giải quyết các vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị UniTranseR, một hệ thống dịch chuyển hoá kỳ quặc gần tượng đài, với tỉ lệ chỉnh chỉnh các chức năng và lập luận về phương tiện hộp thoại đa phương. Cụ thể là, chúng ta đầu tiên nhúng các tính năng đa chiều vào một không gian cấu tạo biến hình tổng hợp để đẩy nhanh các tương tác liên truyền, sau đó tạo ra một lớp mô phỏng s ắp xếp các tính năng và lý lập luận về các điều kiện khác nhau (FAR) để thực hiện việc định giá trị tổng thể, theo cách khác nhau, để xác định rõ mục đích của người dùng để tạo ra các phản ứng chính xác hơn. Các kết quả thử nghiệm xác minh hiệu quả của UniTranSepR, và cho thấy nó vượt trội về phương pháp hiện đại trên bộ dữ liệu MMD đại diện.', 'bg': 'Като по-естествен и интелигентен начин на взаимодействие, мултимодалната система за диалог, ориентирана към задачите наскоро, получи голямо внимание и е постигнат много забележителни напредъци. Въпреки това, почти всички съществуващи проучвания следват плана, за да научат първо интрамодалните характеристики поотделно и след това да проведат проста конкатенация на характеристиките или синтезиране на характеристиките въз основа на вниманието, за да генерират отговори, което им пречи да научат интермодалните взаимодействия и да провеждат междумодално подравняване на характеристиките с цел генериране на по-съзнателни отговори. За да се справим с тези проблеми, предлагаме рамка за семантично представяне на унифицирани трансформатори с подравняване на функциите и мотивиране на намеренията за мултимодални диалогови системи. По-конкретно, първо вграждаме мултимодалните функции в единно семантично пространство на трансформатора, за да подтикваме интермодалните взаимодействия, а след това разработваме слой за подравняване на характеристиките и разсъждения за намерение (ФАР), за да извършим междумодално подравняване на entiтетите и фина обосновка за ключова стойност, така че ефективно да идентифицираме намерението на потребителя за генериране на по-точни отговори. Експерименталните резултати потвърждават ефективността на UniTranSeR, показвайки, че той значително превъзхожда най-съвременните подходи в представителния набор от данни за ММД.', 'da': 'Som en mere naturlig og intelligent interaktionsmetode har det multimodale opgaveorienterede dialogsystem for nylig fået stor opmærksomhed, og der er opnået mange bemærkelsesværdige fremskridt. Ikke desto mindre følger næsten alle eksisterende undersøgelser pipeline for først at lære intramodale funktioner separat og derefter gennemføre simpel funktionssammenkobling eller opmærksomhedsbaseret funktionsfusion for at generere responser, hvilket hindrer dem i at lære intermodale interaktioner og gennemføre cross-modal funktionsjustering for at generere mere intentionsbevidste svar. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi UniTranSeR, en Unified Transformer Semantic Representation framework med funktionsjustering og intention ræsonnement for multimodale dialogsystemer. Specifikt integrerer vi først de multimodale funktioner i et samlet Transformer semantisk rum for at fremkalde intermodale interaktioner, og derefter udtænker vi et funktionstilpasnings- og intentionsræsonnement (FAIR) lag til at udføre cross-modal entity justering og finkornet nøgleværdi ræsonnement, så vi effektivt identificerer brugerens hensigt om at generere mere nøjagtige svar. Eksperimentelle resultater bekræfter effektiviteten af UniTranSeR, hvilket viser, at UniTranSeR betydeligt overgår state-of-the-art tilgange på det repræsentative MMD datasæt.', 'nl': 'Als een meer natuurlijke en intelligente manier van interactie heeft multimodaal taakgericht dialoogsysteem onlangs veel aandacht gekregen en zijn veel opmerkelijke vooruitgang geboekt. Niettemin volgen bijna alle bestaande studies de pijplijn om eerst intramodale kenmerken afzonderlijk te leren en vervolgens eenvoudige functie-aaneenschakeling of aandacht-gebaseerde functie-fusie uit te voeren om reacties te genereren, wat hen belemmert om intermodale interacties te leren en crossmodale functie-uitlijning uit te voeren om meer intentiebewuste reacties te genereren. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, stellen we UniTranSeR voor, een Unified Transformer Semantic Representation framework met functie uitlijning en intentieredenering voor multimodale dialoogsystemen. Specifiek, we insluiten eerst de multimodale functies in een uniforme Transformer semantische ruimte om intermodale interacties te stimuleren, en ontwerpen vervolgens een FAIR-laag (feature alignment and intention redeneering) om crossmodale entiteitsuitlijning en fijnkorrelige sleutelwaarderedenering uit te voeren, om effectief de intentie van de gebruiker voor het genereren van nauwkeurigere reacties te identificeren. Experimentele resultaten bevestigen de effectiviteit van UniTranSeR, waaruit blijkt dat het aanzienlijk beter presteert dan state-of-the-art benaderingen op de representatieve MMD dataset.', 'hr': 'Kao prirodniji i inteligentniji način interakcije, multimodalni dijalogski sustav usmjeren na zadatke nedavno je dobio veliku pažnju i ostvaren je mnogi izvanredni napredak. Međutim, skoro svi postojeći ispitivanja prate cijevi kako bi prvo naučili unutarnje modalne funkcije odvojeno i onda provodili jednostavnu kombinaciju općenitosti ili osnovanu na pažnji funkcije fuziju na „proizvode odgovore, koji ih ometaju od učenja međumodalnih interakcija i provođenja „krsnomodalnih prilagodba “ za stvaranje više odgovora na namjeru. Za rješavanje tih pitanja predlažemo UniTranSeR, okvir semantičkog predstavljanja UniTranSeR, s obzirom na prilagodbu i namjeru za multimodalne dijalogske sustave. Posebno, prvo uključujemo multimodalne karakteristike u ujedinjeno semantičko prostor transformera da bi promaknuli intermodalne interakcije, a zatim smislili sloj prilagodbe i razmišljanja o namjeri (FAIR) kako bi izvršili razmišljanje krsnomodalnih entiteta i razmišljanje ključne vrijednosti, kako bi učinkovito identifikovali namjeru korisnika za stvaranje preciznih odgovora. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju učinkovitost UniTranSeR-a, pokazujući da značajno iznosi pristupe države umjetnosti na predstavničkom setu podataka MMD-a.', 'de': 'Als natürlichere und intelligentere Art der Interaktion hat das multimodale aufgabenorientierte Dialogsystem in letzter Zeit große Aufmerksamkeit erhalten und viele bemerkenswerte Fortschritte wurden erzielt. Dennoch folgen fast alle existierenden Studien der Pipeline, zunächst intramodale Merkmale separat zu lernen und dann einfache Merkmalsverkettungen oder aufmerksamkeitsbasierte Merkmalsverfusionen durchzuführen, um Antworten zu generieren, was sie daran hindert, intermodale Interaktionen zu erlernen und crossmodale Merkmalsvergleich durchzuführen, um intentionsbewusstere Antworten zu generieren. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, schlagen wir UniTranSeR vor, ein Unified Transformer Semantic Representation Framework mit Feature Alignment und Intention Reasoning für multimodale Dialogsysteme. Insbesondere betten wir die multimodalen Features zunächst in einen einheitlichen Transformer-semantischen Raum ein, um intermodale Interaktionen anzuregen, und entwickeln dann eine FAIR-Ebene (Feature Alignment and Intention Reasoning), um eine crossmodale Entity Alignment und eine feingranulare Key-Value-Argumentation durchzuführen, um effektiv die Absicht des Benutzers zu identifizieren, genauere Antworten zu generieren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse bestätigen die Effektivität von UniTranSeR und zeigen, dass es die neuesten Ansätze auf dem repräsentativen MMD-Datensatz deutlich übertrifft.', 'id': 'Sebagai cara interaksi yang lebih alami dan cerdas, sistem dialog multimodal yang mengarientasi tugas baru-baru ini telah menerima perhatian besar dan banyak kemajuan yang luar biasa telah dicapai. Namun, hampir semua studi yang ada mengikuti saluran pipa untuk pertama belajar karakteristik intra modal secara terpisah dan kemudian melakukan konsentrasi karakteristik sederhana atau fusi karakteristik yang berdasarkan perhatian untuk \u200b\u200bmenghasilkan respon, yang menghalangi mereka dari belajar interaksi intermodal dan melakukan \u200b\u200bpenyesuaian karakteristik transmodal untuk menghasilkan respon yang lebih sadar niat. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami mengusulkan UniTranSeR, cadangan Representasi Semantik Transformer Unified dengan penyesuaian fitur dan alasan niat untuk sistem dialog multimodal. Secara spesifik, kita pertama-tama memasukkan fitur multimodal ke ruang semantis Transformer yang bersatu untuk meminta interaksi inter modal, dan kemudian merancang sebuah garis penyesuaian fitur dan alasan niat (FAIR) lapisan untuk melakukan penyesuaian entitas transmodal dan alasan nilai kunci yang sempurna, sehingga secara efektif mengidentifikasi niat pengguna untuk menghasilkan respon lebih akurat. Hasil eksperimen mengkonfirmasi efektivitas UniTranSeR, menunjukkan bahwa hal ini jauh lebih dari pendekatan terbaik pada set data MMD yang mewakili.', 'ko': '더욱 자연스럽고 스마트한 상호작용 방식으로서 임무를 대상으로 하는 다중모드 대화 시스템은 최근 몇 년 동안 광범위한 관심을 받았고 많은 현저한 진전을 거두었다.그러나 거의 모든 기존의 연구는 이러한 사고방식에 따라 먼저 모드 내의 특징을 학습한 다음에 간단한 특징 결합이나 주의적인 특징 융합을 바탕으로 응답을 생성한다. 이것은 그들의 학습 모드 간의 상호작용을 방해하고 다중모드 특징을 맞추어 더 많은 의도적인 감지 응답을 생성한다.이러한 문제점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 UnitTranser를 제기했다. 이것은 통일된 변압기 의미 표시 구조로 다중모드 대화 시스템의 특징을 가지며 일치와 의도 추리를 가진다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 먼저 다중모드적 특징을 통일된 변환기의 의미 공간에 삽입하여 다중모드적 상호작용을 촉진한 다음에 특징적 정렬과 의도적 추리(FAIR)층을 설계하여 다중모드적 실체적 정렬과 세립도 키값 추리를 집행하여 사용자의 의도를 효과적으로 식별하고 더욱 정확한 응답을 생성한다.실험 결과는 UnitTranser의 유효성을 검증했고 대표적인 MMD 데이터 세트에서 가장 선진적인 방법보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'As a more natural and intelligent interaction manner,  multimodal task-oriented dialog system recently has received great attention and many remarkable progresses have been achieved.   Hata hivyo, karibu tafiti zote zinazopo zinafuata pipeline ili kwanza kujifunza vipengele vya kiutamaduni tofauti na kisha kutekeleza mchanganyiko rahisi au mchanganyiko wa vipengele vya kutosha hisia kwa “ kutengeneza miitikio, ambayo yanawalazimisha kujifunza mahusiano ya kiutamaduni na kutekeleza jukumu la kupitia mipango ” ili kutengeneza miitikio yenye lengo la kujua zaidi. Ili kuzungumzia masuala haya, tunapendekeza UniTranSeR, Mfumo wa Umoja wa Mahojiano ya Mjadala wa Mfumo wa Mitandao ya Mjadala wa Taifa na lengo la kujieleza kwa mfumo wa mazungumzo mbalimbali. Kwa ujumla, tuliweka vipengele vya kidunia katika nafasi ya kipekee cha mpito ili kusababisha mahusiano ya kiutamaduni, na baadae kutengeneza jukwaa la kuunganisha na lengo la kusema (FAIR) ili kufanya jukumu la upatikanaji na maana yenye thamani nzuri, ili kutambua lengo la mtumiaji kwa ufanisi wa kutengeneza miitikio sahihi zaidi. … Matokeo ya majaribio yanathibitisha ufanisi wa UniTranSeR, ikionyesha kwamba inaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa unaofanyika na hali ya sanaa kwenye kituo cha taarifa za MMD.', 'fa': 'به عنوان روش تعامل طبیعی و هوشمند بیشتری، سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ چندین مدل اخیرا توجه بسیار زیادی را دریافت کرده است و بسیاری از پیشرفتهای فوق العاده به دست آورده شده است. با این وجود، تقریباً تمام تحقیقات موجود از لوله پیروی می\u200cکنند تا اول ویژگی\u200cهای داخلی مدال را جدا یاد بگیرند و سپس برای ایجاد جواب\u200cهای بیشتری از هوش\u200cآگاهی به ویژگی\u200cهای ساده\u200cای یا توجه به ،تولید کنند، که آنها را از تعامل بین\u200cمدال\u200cها متوقف می\u200cکند و اجرا می\u200cکنند ،تعامل ویژگی\u200cهای متوسط مدال برای حل این مسائل، ما پیشنهاد UniTranSeR، یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ مخصوصا، اولین بار ویژگی\u200cهای چندmodal را در یک فضای متحد تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cای متحد قرار می\u200cدهیم تا تعامل\u200cهای متحد مدال را پیشنهاد کند، و سپس یک طبقه تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی ویژگی و دلیل\u200cدهنده\u200cی قصد (FAIR) را برای انجام تعامل\u200cدهنده\u200cی واژه\u200cهای متحد مدال و دلیل\u200cدهنده\u200cی ارزش کلید\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای پاکیزه\u200cای نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای موثیت UniTranSeR را ثابت می\u200cکند، که نشان می\u200cدهد که آن به طور کلی از نزدیک\u200cهای موضوع هنر روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای نماینده\u200cی MMD بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "Daha tebigat we akylly terjime edilişi ýaly, köp modal täblisä görnüşli dialog sistemasy soňra gowy üns beripdi we çykyş gowy täzelikler berildi. Yöne hemme bar öwrenmeler modal özelliklerini ilkinji gezek öwrenmek üçin pipelini yzarlar we soňra basit özellikler birleşmesi ýa üns tabanly özellikler birleşmesini ;jogaplary döretýär bu şekilde olary modal öwrenmeden öwrenmeden ýöretýär we çykyp modal özellikler çykarmak üçin ;köp niýet-tanyş jogaplary döretýär Bu meseleleri çözmek üçin UniTranSeR'i, bir Birleştirilmiş Semantik Temsilcisi çerçevesi ile, multimodal dijal sistemleri için hedefimiz düşünmesi teklif ediyoruz. Adatça, biz ilkinji gezek multimodal özellikleri birleştirmek üçin bir täze terjime semantik seleňsiz seleňsiz seleňsiz seleňsiz seleňlisini soramak üçin, we so ňra Ullançylaryň niýetini dogry çykarmak we niýeti razlamak üçin bir düzümlerni (FAIR) gatlaky bejer Name", 'sq': "Si një mënyrë më natyrore dhe më inteligjente ndërveprimi, sistemi i dialogut multimodal i orientuar ndaj detyrave kohët e fundit ka marrë vëmendje të madhe dhe janë arritur shumë përparime të çuditshme. Megjithatë, pothuajse të gjitha studimet ekzistuese ndjekin tubacionin për të mësuar së pari karakteristikat intramodale në mënyrë të veçantë dhe pastaj për të kryer një bashkëkalim të thjeshtë të karakteristikave apo bashkëkalim të karakteristikave të bazuara në vëmendje për të gjeneruar përgjigje që i pengon ata nga mësimi i ndërveprimeve ndërmodale dhe kryerja e „ bashkëkalimit ndërmodal të karakteristikave “ për të gjeneruar përgjig Për t'i trajtuar këto çështje, ne propozojmë UniTranSeR, një kuadër i unifikuar i përfaqësimit Semantik Transformer me përshtatje dhe arsyetim synimi për sistemet e dialogut multimodal. Në mënyrë specifike, ne s ë pari përfshijmë karakteristikat multimodale në një hapësirë të unifikuar semantike Transformer për të nxitur ndërveprimet ndër-modale, dhe pastaj krijojmë një nivel të përshtatjes së karakteristikave dhe arsyetimit të qëllimit (FAIR) për të kryer përshtatjen ndër-modale të njësisë dhe arsyetimin e vlerave kyçe të holla, në mënyrë që të identifikojmë efektivisht qëllimin e përdoruesit për krijimin e përgjigjev Rezultatet eksperimentale verifikojnë efektshmërinë e UniTranSeR, duke treguar se ajo ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më të lartë se metodat më të larta në grupin përfaqësues të të dhënave MMD.", 'am': 'በአካባቢ እና የብሔራዊ እና የአስተዋይ ግንኙነት እንዳደረገ፣ የብዙ አካባቢ ስራዎችን አቀናኝቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ሁኔታ ያሉት ትምህርት ሁሉ አስቀድሞ ለልዩ ለመማር የተለየ ጥያቄን ተከተሉ፣ ከዚያም ቀላል የፍትሕት ምርጫዎች ማሰናከል ወይም የጥያቄ ምርጫዎች ፍጻሜ ማሳየት ይደረጋሉ፡፡ እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለመቀበል፣ UniTranSeR፣ አንድ የተለየ ትርጓሜ ስምናኒክ ተሟጋቾች ሥርዓት እና ለብዙ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ስርዓት ስርዓቶች ማቀናቀል እና ማስታወቂያውን እናስባለን፡፡ በተለያዩም፣ አስቀድመን የብዙኃን ምርጫዎች በተለየ የፊደል ቅርጽ ማቀናቀል እና በሞዴል interactions ለመፈጠር እና የፊደል ቅርጽ ማቀናቀል እና የልማት ደረጃን ለመሠረት እና የመስመር ክፍተት ማቀናቀል እና የተመሳሳይ የቁልፍ-ግምገማዎች ምክንያት ለመፈለግ እና በተጨማሪም የቁልፍ-ግምገማ ምክንያት ለመጠቀም የሚጠቃሚ ስልቶች ለመፍጠር የሚችሉትን አቃውሞ ለመግለጥ እና ለመ ፈተናው ውጤቶች የዩንቴርስክኤርን አካባቢ እንዲያረጋግጥ እና በኤምአዲ ዳታ ማዕከላዊ ግንኙነት በጥቅምነት እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "As 'n meer natuurlike en inteligente interaksie manier, het multimodaal taak-oriëntasie dialoog stelsel onlangs groot aandag ontvang en baie merkelike vorderings is bereik. Maar byna al bestaande studies volg die pyperlyn om eerste intra-modaal funksies te leer skei en dan uitvoer eenvoudige funksie samelewing of aandag-gebaseerde funksiefuusie na “ genereer antwoordes , wat hulle hampers van onderwerp van intermodaal interaksies en gedrag “ kruismodaal funksie alignering “ vir die genereer van meer intensie-bewysende antwoordes . Om hierdie probleme te raak, voorstel ons UniTranSeR, 'n Unified Transformer Semantic Representative Raamwerk met funksie belyning en intensie redering vir multimodale dialoog stelsels. Spesifieke, ons ingesluit eerste die multimodale funksies binne 'n eenvoudige Transformer semantiese spasie om intermodale interaksies te vra en dan 'n funksiealignering en intensie redering (FAIR) laag om kruismodale entiteit-alignment en fyn-grained sleutel-waarde-redering te doen, sodat om gebruiker se intensie effektief te identifiseer om meer presies reaksies te genereer. Eksperimentale resultate bevestig die effektiviteit van UniTranSeR, wys dat dit betekeurig uitvoer staat-van-kuns toegang aan die reprezentante MMD-datastel.", 'bn': 'আরো প্রাকৃতিক এবং বুদ্ধিমান বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়া হিসেবে মাল্টিমোডাল কাজের দিক থেকে আলোচনার সিস্টেম সম্প্রতি অনেক মনোযোগ পেয় তবে প্রায় সকল বিদ্যমান গবেষণা পাইপেলাইনের অনুসরণ করে প্রথমে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য শিখার জন্য এবং তারপর সাধারণ বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈশিষ্ট্যের ফ এই সমস্ত বিষয়গুলো নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা ইউনিট্রানসের প্রস্তাব করছি, যিনি একটি একত্রিত ট্রান্সফার্নার্নাফার্স সেম্যান্টিক প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথম বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্য একটি একত্রিত ট্রান্সফার্মান্টিক সেমেন্টিক স্থানে ঢুকিয়ে দিয়েছি যাতে মোডালের মধ্যে মোডাল ইন্টারনেটেশনের দ্বারা তৈরি করার জন্য, তারপর একটি বৈশি পরীক্ষার ফলাফল ইউনিট্রানসের কার্যকর্ম পরীক্ষা করে দেখাচ্ছে যে এমএমডি ডাটাসেটের প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিদের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্', 'hy': 'Որպես ավելի բնական և խելացի փոխազդեցության միջոց, վերջերս բազմամոդալ գործողությունների վրա հիմնված հաղորդակցման համակարգը շատ ուշադրություն է ստացել, և շատ նշանակալի առաջընթացներ են հասել: Այնուամենայնիվ, գրեթե բոլոր գոյություն ունեցող ուսումնասիրությունները հետևում են խողովակաշարին, որպեսզի նախ առանձին սովորեն ներմոդալ հատկանիշները և հետո կատարեն պարզ հատկանիշներ կամ ուշադրության հիմնված հատկանիշներ ֆունկցիոնալ ֆունկցիոնալ ֆունկցիոնալ ֆունկցիոնալ ֆունկցիոնալ ֆունկցիոնալ ֆունկցի Այս խնդիրներին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք UniTransmSeR-ը, Միացյալ տրանֆորմային սեմատիկ ներկայացուցիչ շրջանակ, որը ունի առանձնահատկություններ համապատասխանելու և մտադրության հիմնավորումներ բազմամոդալ երկխուզային Մասնավորապես, մենք առաջին անգամ ներդրեցինք բազմամոդալ հատկանիշները միավորված տրանֆորմային սեմանտիկ տարածության մեջ, որպեսզի արագացնենք միջմոդալ փոխազդեցությունները, ապա ստեղծեցինք հատկանիշների հարմարեցման և մտադրության (ՖԱԻՌ) շերտ, որպեսզի կատարենք միջմոդալ էության հարմարեցման և նրբագեղ հատկանիշներ, որպեսզի արդյունա Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ստուգում են UniTransn SeR-ի արդյունավետությունը, ցույց տալով, որ այն նշանակաբար գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր մոտեցումները ներկայացնող ՄՄԴ տվյալների համակարգում:', 'ca': "Com a manera d'interacció més natural i intel·ligent, fa poc ha rebut gran atenció el sistema de diàleg multimodal orientat a les tasques i han aconseguit molts progrés notables. No obstant això, gairebé tots els estudis existents segueixen el pipeline per primer aprendre les característiques intramodals separadament i després conduir concatenació de característiques senzilles o fusió de característiques basades en l'atenció per a generar respostes que els impedeixen d'aprendre interaccions intermodals i d'allinjar les característiques transmodals per generar respostes més conscients de l'intenció. Per abordar aquests problemes, proposem UniTranSeR, un marc unificat de Representació Semàtica Transformer a amb alliniament de característiques i raonament d'intenció per sistemes de diàleg multimodal. Concretament, primer vam incorporar les característiques multimodal s en un espai semàntic de Transformer unificat per impulsar interaccions intermodals, i després vam dissenyar una capa d'alliniament de característiques i raonament d'intenció (FAIR) per fer alliniament entre entitats intermodals i raonament de valor clau fins, per identificar efectivament la intenció de l'usuari de generar respostes més exactes. Els resultats experimentals verifiquen l'eficacia de UniTranSeR, mostrant que supera significativament els enfocaments més avançats en el conjunt de dades representatius de MMD.", 'cs': 'Jako přirozenější a inteligentnější způsob interakce se multimodální dialogový systém orientovaný na úkoly v poslední době věnoval velké pozornosti a bylo dosaženo mnoha pozoruhodných pokroků. Nicméně, téměř všechny stávající studie sledují potrubí, aby se nejprve naučily intramodální prvky samostatně a poté prováděly jednoduché řetězení prvků nebo fúzi funkcí založené na pozornosti k generování odpovědí, což jim brání učit se intermodální interakce a provádět crossmodální sladění prvků pro generování více záměrných reakcí. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme UniTranSeR, Unified Transformer Sémantic Representation framework s zarovnáním funkcí a uvažováním záměrů pro multimodální dialogové systémy. Konkrétně nejprve vložíme multimodální prvky do sjednoceného sémantického prostoru Transformeru, abychom vyvolali intermodální interakce, a pak navrhneme vrstvu zarovnání funkcí a záměrného uvažování (FAIR), která provádí zarovnání intermodálních entit a jemné uvažování klíčových hodnot, abychom efektivně identifikovali záměr uživatele generovat přesnější odpovědi. Experimentální výsledky ověřují účinnost UniTranSeR a ukazují, že výrazně překonává moderní přístupy na reprezentativním MMD datovém souboru.', 'az': "Daha təbiətli və a ğıllı təşkil yolu olaraq, çoxlu modal task-oriented dialog sistemi yenidən çox dikkat alır və çoxlu təşkil gəlir. Ancaq, az qala bütün mövcud çalışmalar fərqli fərqli fərqli öyrənmək üçün pipeline ardınca gedir və sonra çox niyyətli cavab vermək üçün çox modal fərqli tərzləri öyrənməkdən və çox modal fərqli tərzlərini öyrənməkdən çəkir. Bu məsələləri çəkmək üçün UniTranSeR, bir birləşdirilmiş Transformer Semantik Representation framework ü ilə çoxlu modal dialoğu sistemləri üçün fikirləşdirmək və fikirləşdirmək üçün təklif edirik. Özellikle, biz ilk dəfə çoxlu modal özellikləri birləşdirir semantik bir yer içində birləşdiririk ki, modal inter-modal inter-interactions soruşmaq üçün, sonra çoxlu modal entity alignment və fine-grained key-value reasoning etmək üçün fərqli tərzi və niyyət reasoning (FAIR) düzümünü təşkil edirik, böylece istifadəçinin daha doğru cavab vermək niyyətini təşkil edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçları UniTranSeR'nin etkinliğini təsdiqləyir, göstərir ki, o, MMD veri qutusu ilə mövcuddur mövcuddur.", 'bs': 'Kao prirodniji i inteligentniji način interakcije, multimodalni dijalogski sistem usmjeren na zadatke nedavno je dobio veliku pažnju i ostvaren je mnogi izvanredni napredak. Međutim, skoro svi postojeći ispitivanja prate cijevi kako bi prvo naučili unutarnje modalne funkcije odvojeno, a zatim proveli jednostavnu kombinaciju općenitosti ili osnovanu na pažnji funkcije fuziju na „stvaraju odgovore, koji ih ometaju od učenja međumodalnih interakcija i provođenja „krsnomodalnog poravnanja funkcija “ za stvaranje više odgovora na namjeru. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predlažemo UniTranSeR, okvir semantičkog predstavljanja univerzitog transformera sa opcijama usklađenja i namjerama za sisteme multimodalnog dijaloga. Posebno, prvo uključujemo multimodalne karakteristike u ujedinjeno semantičko prostor transformera da bi promenili intermodalne interakcije, a zatim smislili sloj pripravnosti i razmatranja namjere (FAIR) kako bi izvršili razmjenu pripravnosti krsnomodalnih entiteta i razmatranja ključnih vrijednosti, kako bi efikasno identifikovali namjeru korisnika za stvaranje preciznijih odgovora. Eksperimentalni rezultati provjeravaju učinkovitost UniTranSeR, pokazujući da značajno iznosi pristupe države umjetnosti na predstavničkom setu podataka MMD.', 'fi': 'Luonnollisempana ja älykkäämmänä vuorovaikutustavana multimodaalinen tehtävälähtöinen vuoropuhelujärjestelmä on viime aikoina saanut paljon huomiota ja monia merkittäviä edistysaskelia on saavutettu. Lähes kaikissa nykyisissä tutkimuksissa kuitenkin opetellaan ensin modaalisia ominaisuuksia erikseen ja sen jälkeen tehdään yksinkertainen ominaisuusyhdistäminen tai huomiopohjainen ominaisuusfuusio vastausten saamiseksi, mikä estää niitä oppimasta intermodaalisia vuorovaikutuksia ja suorittamasta multimodaalisia ominaisuuksien yhdenmukaistamista tarkoituksellisuudesta tietoisempien vastausten tuottamiseksi. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme UniTranSeR:ää, yhtenäistä muuntajan semanttista edustusta, jossa on ominaisuuksien linjaus ja aikomusperusteet multimodaalisille dialogijärjestelmille. Erityisesti upotamme multimodaaliset ominaisuudet ensin yhtenäiseen Transformer-semanttiseen tilaan intermodaalisia vuorovaikutuksia varten ja kehitämme sitten Feature Alignment and Inteition Racing (FAIR) -kerroksen, joka suorittaa intermodaalisen entiteetin tasauksen ja hienojakoisen avainarvon päättelyn, jotta voidaan tehokkaasti tunnistaa käyttäjän aikomus tuottaa tarkempia vastauksia. Kokeelliset tulokset vahvistavat UniTranSeR:n tehokkuuden osoittaen, että se on merkittävästi parempi kuin uusimmat lähestymistavat edustavassa MMD-aineistossa.', 'et': 'Loomulikuma ja arukama suhtlemisviisina on mitmeliigiline ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteem hiljuti saanud suurt tähelepanu ning saavutatud on palju märkimisväärseid edusamme. Sellegipoolest järgitakse peaaegu kõiki olemasolevaid uuringuid, et esmalt õppida liiklusesiseseid funktsioone eraldi ja seejärel viia läbi lihtne funktsioonide ühendamine või tähelepanupõhine funktsioonide ühendamine, et luua vastuseid, mis takistab neil õppida liiklusesiseseid interaktsioone ja viia läbi liikidevahelisi funktsioone ühtlustamine kavatsusteadlikumate reageeringute saamiseks. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja UniTranSeR, ühtse transformaatori semantilise esindamise raamistiku, millel on funktsioonide joondamine ja kavatsuste põhjendamine multimodaalsete dialoogisüsteemide jaoks. Täpsemalt integreerime esmalt multimodaalsed funktsioonid ühtsesse Transformeri semantilisse ruumi, et soodustada intermodaalseid interaktsioone, ning seejärel töötame välja funktsioonide joondamise ja kavatsuste põhjendamise kihi (FAIR), et sooritada modaalseid olemeid ja täpsemaid võtmeväärtuste põhjendamisi, et tõhusalt tuvastada kasutaja kavatsus luua täpsemaid vastuseid. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused kinnitavad UniTranSeRi efektiivsust, näidates, et UniTranSeRi tulemused ületavad oluliselt kaasaegseid lähenemisviise representatiivse MMD andmekogumi puhul.', 'jv': 'Taning NoneInclude threshold To Address this question, we proposal UniTranSeR, a Uniified Transformer semanti representation frame with character alignment and enthion ratioing for multimodal dialog sistems. CURRENTCURRENT Rejalaké sing paling nggunian kang UniTranSeR, wong-wong kuwi wis ngerasakno dadi nggawe barang langgar tarjamah-layang', 'ha': "Kama da wata irin aikin aiki na asali da masu hankali, na'urar zauren akwatin bayani na multi-doki a yanzu suka motsa sauri mai girma kuma an sami mafiya motsi masu girma. A lokacin da, taki, ko dukkan ardayan da ke jira, sai ka bi piilen don a iya karanta wasu tsari na-moda separately, kuma ka yi aiki da fushi mai sauƙi wa hushi ko fomat masu bincike zuwa , mai ƙiƙiro juyin zuwa , wanda ya ƙara su daga karanta intergalar-modal da ke tafiyar da juyin-masu tsari da ke sani. Yana buƙata masu yiwuwa, Munã buɗar da UniTranSeR, wata firam na Transformer Semantic Reposition na UniTranSeR da shirin juyi da masu shawara wa zauren akwatin bayani masu yawa. Aka ƙayyade, Mun ɗau masu amfani da multi-multi cikin wani fili na haɗi da Transformer don mu samu da amfani da wajen samun haɗi masu tsakanin-modal, s a'an nan kuma muka ƙayyade wani runduna masu daidaita da hankali da ke so ga tafiyar masu tsari da masu nau'i na-modal (FAIR) don ya yi amfani da shi kafin ka gane wa ya sami matsayin mai daidaita. Matarin jarrabai sun gaskata aikin UniTranSeR, kuma ya nuna cewa yana mai significant outdo state-of-the-art takiyanci kan danna MMD.", 'sk': 'Kot bolj naravni in inteligentni način interakcije je multimodalni dialogni sistem, usmerjen v naloge, v zadnjem času dobil veliko pozornosti in dosežen je bil veliko izjemnih napredkov. Kljub temu skoraj vse obstoječe študije sledijo načrtu, da se najprej naučijo znotraj modalnih značilnosti ločeno in nato izvedejo preprosto združevanje značilnosti ali združevanje značilnosti, ki temelji na pozornosti, da ustvarijo odzive, kar jim ovira učenje intermodalnih interakcij in izvajanje medmodalnih usklajevanja značilnosti za ustvarjanje bolj zavedanih odzivov. Za reševanje teh vprašanj predlagamo UniTranSeR, okvir enotnega transformatorskega semantičnega predstavništva z usklajevanjem funkcij in intencionalnim razlogom za multimodalne dialogne sisteme. Natančneje, najprej vključimo multimodalne funkcije v enoten semantični prostor transformatorja, da bi spodbudili intermodalne interakcije, nato pa oblikujemo plast poravnave funkcij in intention argument (FAIR) za izvedbo medmodalne poravnave entitet in natančnega razumevanja ključnih vrednosti, da bi učinkovito prepoznali namen uporabnika za ustvarjanje natančnejših odzivov. Eksperimentalni rezultati preverjajo učinkovitost UniTranSeR in kažejo, da znatno presega najsodobnejše pristope na reprezentativnem naboru podatkov MMD.', 'he': 'כדרך אינטראקציה טבעית ויותר אינטליגנטית, מערכת דיאלוג ממוקדת למשימות רבות לאחרונה קיבלה תשומת לב גדולה והתקדמות רבות מדהימות הושגה. למרות זאת, כמעט כל המחקרים הנוכחים עוקבים אחרי הצינור כדי לראשונה ללמוד תכונות בתוך מודל בנפרד ואז להבצע תכונות פשוטות קוטטנציה או מיזוג תכונות מבוססת תשומת לב כדי להתמודד עם הנושאים האלה, אנו מציעים UniTranSeR, מסגרת מייצג סמנטי מעבר מאוחדת במיוחד, קודם נכניס את המאפיינים המולטומודאליים לחלל סמנטי טרנספורס מאוחד כדי להזעיק אינטראקציות בין-מודליות, ואז לתכנן שכבה של התאמה והסיבה בכוונה (FAIR) כדי לבצע התאמה בין-מודלית בין-מודלית ולהגיון הערך-המפתח מוצק, כדי לזהות באופן יעיל את כוונתו של המשתמש לייצר תשובות מדויקות יותר. תוצאות ניסיוניות מאשרות את היעילות של UniTranSeR, מראות שהיא יוצאת משמעות יותר מגישות חדשות במידע המייצג של MMD.', 'bo': "སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་ཆེན་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ན་འདུག Nevertheless, almost all existing studies follow the pipeline to first learn intra-modal features separately and then conduct simple feature concatenation or attention-based feature fusion to  generate responses, which hampers them from learning inter-modal interactions and conducting  cross-modal feature alignment  for generating more intention-aware responses. To address these issues, we propose UniTranSeR, a Unified Transformer Semantic Representation framework with feature alignment and intention reasoning for multimodal dialog systems. Specifically, we first embed the multimodal feature s into a unified Transformer semantic space to prompt inter-modal interactions, and then devise a feature alignment and intention reasoning (FAIR) layer to perform cross-modal entity alignment and fine-grained key-value reasoning, so as to effectively identify user's intention for generating more accurate responses. Experimental results verify the effectiveness of UniTranSeR, showing that it is significantly outperforming the state-of-the-art approaches on the representative MMD dataset."}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network لتتبع حالة الحوار متعدد المجالات', 'es': 'Red de fusión de gráficos de esquema dinámico para el seguimiento del estado de diálogo multidominio', 'fr': "Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network pour le suivi de l'état des dialogues", 'pt': 'Rede de fusão de gráficos de esquema dinâmico para rastreamento de estado de diálogo de vários domínios', 'ja': 'マルチドメインダイアログの状態トラッキングのための動的スキーマグラフフュージョンネットワーク', 'zh': '以多域言动模式图合网络', 'hi': 'मल्टी-डोमेन संवाद स्थिति ट्रैकिंग के लिए डायनेमिक स्कीमा ग्राफफ्यूजन नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Сеть слияния графиков динамической схемы для отслеживания состояний многодоменного диалога', 'ga': 'Líonra Comhleá Graf Scéimre Dinimiciúla do Rianú Stáit Idirphlé Ilfhearainn', 'el': 'Δίκτυο σύντηξης γραφικών δυναμικών σχημάτων για παρακολούθηση κατάστασης διαλόγου πολλαπλών τομέων', 'hu': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialogue State Tracking', 'ka': 'დინამიკური სქემა გრაფიკური ფუზიციის ქსელი მრავალეთომენური დიალოგის სტატის შენახველისთვის', 'kk': 'КөпDomain диалог күйін қадағалау үшін динамикалық сұлбаның графикалық фузия желі', 'lt': 'Dinaminis grafinės sintezės tinklas daugiadominiam dialogui sekti', 'it': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network per il monitoraggio dello stato di dialogo multi-dominio', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Fusi Graf Skema Dinamik untuk Pengjejak Keadaan Dialog Berbilang Domain', 'mt': 'Netwerk Dinamiku ta’ Fużjoni Grafika ta’ Skema għal Traċċar mill-Istat ta’ Djalogu Multidomestiku', 'ml': 'Multi- Domain ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്കിങ്', 'mn': 'Динамик схема график Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialog State Tracking', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Dynamiczna sieć syntezy schematów graficznych dla śledzenia stanu dialogów wieloodziennych', 'ro': 'Rețeaua dinamică de fuziune a graficului schemei grafice pentru urmărirea stării dialogului cu mai multe domenii', 'sr': 'Динамична схема графикова фузионна мрежа за трагиране дјалога диалога за многодомене', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ඩොමේන් සංවාද ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සාධාන්\u200dය ස්කීමා ග්\u200dරාෆ් ෆුසියෝන් ජාලය', 'so': 'Shabakadda muuqashada saemada ee Graph Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialogue State Tracking', 'sv': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network för spårning av tillstånd för flerdomänsdialoger', 'ta': 'Multi- Domain Dialogue State Tracking', 'ur': 'Multi-Domain Dialog State Tracking کے لئے داینامیک سکیما گراف فوزین نیٹ ورک', 'uz': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialogue State Tracking', 'vi': 'Hệ thống rung động/ Truyền âm thanh đa miền cho việc theo dõi quốc gia', 'bg': 'Динамична схема Графична мрежа за проследяване на състоянието на диалога с множество домейни', 'hr': 'Dynamiska mreža za fuziju grafika grafika za praćenje državnog dijaloga multidomenata', 'da': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialogue State Tracking', 'nl': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network voor het bijhouden van de status van dialoogvensters met meerdere domeinen', 'de': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network für die Zustandsverfolgung von Dialogen mit mehreren Domänen', 'id': 'Rangkaian Fusi Graf Skema Dinamik untuk Penjejakan Negara Dialog Multi-Domain', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '다역 대화 상태 추적에 사용되는 동적 모드맵 융합 네트워크', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Ujadala wa Mpango wa Graph wa Dynamics kwa ajili ya ufuatiliaji wa Taifa ya Dialogue Multi-Domain', 'sq': 'Rrjeti dinamik i fusionit grafik për gjurmimin e gjendjes së dialogut multidomenik', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'tr': 'Multi-Domain Dialog Durum İzlenmesi üçin dinamik grafik maglumaty', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Multi-Domain Dialog İzlənməsi üçün dinamik Şema Grafik Fusion Ağığı', 'bn': 'বহুডোমেইন ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্রের জন্য ডায়ানিমিক স্কীমা গ্রাফ ফ ফাশন নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Dinamička mreža za fuziju grafika Schema za praćenje državnog dijaloga multidomenata', 'ca': "Una xarxa dinàmica de fusió gráfica d'esquema per a seguir l'estat del diàleg multidominiu", 'cs': 'Síť dynamického schématu Graf Fusion Network pro sledování stavu dialogů s více doménami', 'et': 'Dünaamiline skeem Graph Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialogue State Tracking', 'fi': 'Dynaaminen Schema Graph Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialogue State Tracking', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Dinamično shemo Graph Fusion omrežje za sledenje stanja v večdomenskem dialogu', 'bo': 'Dynamic Schema Graph Fusion Network for Multi-Domain Dialog State Tracking'}
{'en': 'Document structure is critical for efficient information consumption. However, it is challenging to encode it efficiently into the modern Transformer architecture. In this work, we present HIBRIDS, which injects Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure into attention score calculation. We further present a new task, hierarchical question-summary generation, for summarizing salient content in the source document into a hierarchy of questions and summaries, where each follow-up question inquires about the content of its parent question-summary pair. We also annotate a new dataset with 6,153 question-summary hierarchies labeled on government reports. Experiment results show that our model produces better question-summary hierarchies than comparisons on both hierarchy quality and content coverage, a finding also echoed by human judges. Additionally, our model improves the generation of long-form summaries from long government reports and Wikipedia articles, as measured by ROUGE scores.', 'ar': 'يهدف تتبع حالة الحوار (DST) إلى تتبع نوايا المستخدمين أثناء المحادثة. في DST ، لا تزال نمذجة العلاقات بين المجالات والفتحات مشكلة غير مدروسة جيدًا. المناهج الحالية التي نظرت في مثل هذه العلاقات تقصر عمومًا في: (1) دمج علاقات العضوية السابقة في نطاق الفتحة وعلاقات الفتحات الديناميكية المدركة للحوار بشكل صريح ، و (2) التعميم على المجالات غير المرئية. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقترح عمل \\ textbf {D} ynamic \\ textbf {S} chema \\ textbf {G} raph \\ textbf {F} usion \\ textbf {Net} (\\ textbf {DSGFNet}) ، والذي ينتج عنه الرسم البياني للمخطط الديناميكي لدمج علاقات العضوية السابقة بنطاق الفتحة بشكل صريح وعلاقات الفتحات الديناميكية المدركة للحوار. كما أنه يستخدم المخططات لتسهيل نقل المعرفة إلى مجالات جديدة. يتكون DSGFNet من مشفر الكلام المنطقي للحوار ، ومشفّر الرسم البياني للمخطط ، وشبكة تطوير الرسم البياني للمخطط المدرك للحوار ، وفك ترميز حالة الحوار المحسّن بالرسم البياني للمخطط. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية (أي SGD و MultiWOZ2.1 و MultiWOZ2.2) أن DSGFNet يتفوق على الأساليب الحالية.', 'es': 'El seguimiento del estado de diálogo (DST) tiene como objetivo realizar un seguimiento de las intenciones de los usuarios durante el curso de una conversación. En DST, modelar las relaciones entre dominios y franjas horarias sigue siendo un problema poco estudiado. Los enfoques existentes que han considerado tales relaciones generalmente se quedan cortos en: (1) fusionar explícitamente las relaciones de pertenencia al dominio de ranura anteriores y las relaciones de ranura dinámicas conscientes del diálogo, y (2) generalizar a dominios invisibles. Para abordar estos problemas, proponemos un trabajo novedoso\\ textbf {D} dinámico\\ textbf {S} chema\\ textbf {G} raph\\ textbf {F} usion\\ textbf {Net} (\\ textbf {DSGFnet}), que genera un gráfico de esquema dinámico para fusionar explícitamente las relaciones de membresía de dominio de ranura anteriores y las relaciones de ranura dinámicas conscientes del diálogo. También utiliza los esquemas para facilitar la transferencia de conocimientos a nuevos dominios. DSGFnet consiste en un codificador de enunciados de diálogo, un codificador de gráficos de esquema, una red de evolución de gráficos de esquema sensible al diálogo y un decodificador de estado de diálogo mejorado de gráficos de esquema. Los resultados empíricos en los conjuntos de datos de referencia (es decir, SGD, MultiWoZ2.1 y MultiWoZ2.2) muestran que DSGFnet supera a los métodos existentes.', 'fr': "Le suivi de l'état du dialogue (DST) vise à suivre les intentions des utilisateurs au cours d'une conversation. En DST, la modélisation des relations entre les domaines et les créneaux est encore un problème peu étudié. Les approches existantes qui ont pris en compte de telles relations sont généralement insuffisantes pour\xa0: (1) fusionner explicitement les relations d'appartenance au domaine d'emplacement antérieures et les relations dynamiques de créneau sensibles au dialogue, et (2) généraliser aux domaines non vus. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons un nouveau\xa0\\ textbf {D} ynamic\xa0\\ textbf {S} chema\xa0\\ textbf {G} raph\xa0\\ textbf {F} usion\xa0\\ textbf {Net} work (\\ textbf {dsGFnet}), qui génère un graphe de schéma dynamique pour fusionner explicitement les relations d'appartenance au domaine d'emplacement précédentes et les relations dynamiques d'emplacement sensibles au dialogue. Il utilise également les schémas pour faciliter le transfert de connaissances vers de nouveaux domaines. DSGFnet se compose d'un codeur d'énoncé de dialogue, d'un codeur de graphe de schéma, d'un réseau évolutif de graphe de schéma sensible au dialogue et d'un décodeur d'état de dialogue amélioré par graphe de schéma. Les résultats empiriques sur des ensembles de données de référence (c'est-à-dire SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 et MultiWOZ2.2) montrent que DSGFnet surpasse les méthodes existantes.", 'pt': 'O Dialogue State Tracking (DST) tem como objetivo acompanhar as intenções dos usuários durante uma conversa. Em DST, modelar as relações entre domínios e slots ainda é um problema pouco estudado. As abordagens existentes que consideraram tais relações geralmente falham em: (1) fundir relações de associação de domínio de slot anteriores e relações de slot dinâmicas com reconhecimento de diálogo explicitamente e (2) generalizar para domínios invisíveis. Para resolver esses problemas, propomos um novo \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), que gera um gráfico de esquema dinâmico para fundir explicitamente as relações de associação de domínio de slot anteriores e as relações de slot dinâmicas com reconhecimento de diálogo. Ele também usa os esquemas para facilitar a transferência de conhecimento para novos domínios. O DSGFNet consiste em um codificador de enunciado de diálogo, um codificador de gráfico de esquema, uma rede em evolução de gráfico de esquema com reconhecimento de diálogo e um decodificador de estado de diálogo aprimorado por gráfico de esquema. Resultados empíricos em conjuntos de dados de referência (ou seja, SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 e MultiWOZ2.2), mostram que o DSGFNet supera os métodos existentes.', 'ja': 'Dialogue State Tracking （ DST ）は、会話の過程でユーザーの意図を追跡することを目的としています。 DSTでは、ドメインとスロット間の関係をモデル化することはまだ研究不足の問題です。 そのような関係を考慮してきた既存のアプローチは、一般的に、（ 1 ）以前のスロットドメインのメンバーシップ関係と対話を意識した動的スロット関係を明示的に融合すること、および（ 2 ）見えないドメインに一般化することに欠けている。 これらの問題に対処するために、私たちは新しい\\ textbf {D} ynamic\\ textbf {S} chema\\ textbf {G} raph\\ textbf {F} usion\\ textbf {Net} work (\\ textbf {DSGFNet})を提案します。これは、以前のスロットドメインのメンバーシップ関係とダイアログを意識した動的スロット関係を明示的に融合するための動的スキーマグラフを生成します。 また、スキーマを使用して、新しいドメインへの知識の転送を容易にします。 DSGFNetは、ダイアログ発話エンコーダ、スキーマグラフエンコーダ、ダイアログ認識スキーマグラフ進化ネットワーク、およびスキーマグラフ拡張ダイアログ状態デコーダからなる。 ベンチマークデータセット（すなわち、SGD、MultiWOZ2.1、およびMultiWOZ2.2 ）の実証結果は、DSGFNetが既存の方法を上回ることを示している。', 'zh': '言随 (DST) 指用户意在言中。 DST 之中,对域槽之际建模犹一究其不足也。 念今法以下常不足:(1)明融前时隙域、对感动时,及(2)推至不见之域。 为此一新颖 \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph ttbf{F}usi oon \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet})成一动模式图,以显式融前插槽-域成员关系对语感动插槽。 又用模式,促进新领。 DSGFNet 言编码器、式图编码器、言感式图演网络与式图增强型对解码器成。 准数集(即SGD,MultiWOZ2.1、MultiWOZ2.2)经验结果表明,DSGFNet优于今法。', 'hi': 'संवाद राज्य ट्रैकिंग (डीएसटी) का उद्देश्य बातचीत के दौरान उपयोगकर्ताओं के इरादों का ट्रैक रखना है। डीएसटी में, डोमेन और स्लॉट के बीच संबंधों को मॉडलिंग करना अभी भी एक कम अध्ययन की गई समस्या है। मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण जिन्होंने इस तरह के संबंधों पर विचार किया है, वे आम तौर पर कम हो जाते हैं: (1) पूर्व स्लॉट-डोमेन सदस्यता संबंधों और संवाद-जागरूक गतिशील स्लॉट संबंधों को स्पष्ट रूप से फ्यूज करना, और (2) अनदेखी डोमेन को सामान्यीकृत करना। इन समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास का प्रस्ताव करते हैं \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), जो पूर्व स्लॉट-डोमेन सदस्यता संबंधों और संवाद-जागरूक गतिशील स्लॉट संबंधों को स्पष्ट रूप से फ्यूज करने के लिए एक गतिशील स्कीमा ग्राफ उत्पन्न करता है। यह नए डोमेन में ज्ञान हस्तांतरण की सुविधा के लिए स्कीमाटा का भी उपयोग करता है। DSGFNet में एक संवाद उच्चारण एन्कोडर, एक स्कीमा ग्राफ एन्कोडर, एक संवाद-जागरूक स्कीमा ग्राफ विकसित नेटवर्क, और एक स्कीमा ग्राफ एन्हांस्ड डायलॉग स्टेट डिकोडर होता है। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट (यानी, SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, और MultiWOZ2.2) पर अनुभवजन्य परिणाम दिखाते हैं कि DSGFNet मौजूदा तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Отслеживание состояния диалога (DST) направлено на отслеживание намерений пользователей в ходе разговора. В DST моделирование отношений между доменами и слотами по-прежнему является недостаточно изученной проблемой. Существующие подходы, которые рассматривали такие отношения, как правило, недостаточны в: 1) слиянии ранее существовавших отношений членства в слот-доменах и явно выраженных динамических отношений "диалог-слот", и 2) обобщении невидимых областей. Для решения этих проблем мы предлагаем новую \\textbf{D} ynamic\\textbf{S} chema\\textbf{G} raph\\textbf{F} usion\\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), которая генерирует график динамической схемы для явного слияния предшествующих отношений членства в домене слота и отношений динамического слота, основанных на диалоге. Она также использует эти схемы для облегчения передачи знаний в новые области. DSGFNet состоит из кодировщика высказываний диалога, кодировщика графов схемы, развивающейся сети графов схемы, основанной на диалоге, и декодера состояний расширенного диалога графов схемы. Эмпирические результаты по эталонным наборам данных (т.е. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 и MultiWOZ2.2) показывают, что DSGFNet превосходит существующие методы.', 'ga': "Tá sé mar aidhm ag Rianú Stáit Idirphlé (DST) súil a choinneáil ar intinní úsáideoirí le linn an chomhrá. In DST, is fadhb nach bhfuil mórán staidéir déanta uirthi fós í samhaltú an chaidrimh idir fearann agus sliotán. Is iondúil go mbíonn na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana a bhreathnaítear ar chaidreamh den sórt sin gearr: (1) caidreamh ballraíochta d’fhearainn sliotán roimhe seo agus caidreamh sliotán dinimiciúla atá feasach ar an idirphlé a chomhnascadh go sainráite, agus (2) ginearálú chuig fearainn neamhfheicthe. Chun dul i ngleic leis na saincheisteanna seo, molaimid úrscéal \\textbf{D}dinimiciúil \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), a ghineann a graf scéimre dinimiciúil chun an caidreamh ballraíochta d'fhearann sliotán roimhe seo agus an caidreamh sliotán dinimiciúla atá feasach ar an gcomhphlé a chomhleá go sainráite. Úsáideann sé an scéimre freisin chun aistriú eolais chuig fearainn nua a éascú. Is éard atá i DSGFNet ná ionchódóir cainte idirphlé, ionchódóir graf scéimre, líonra éabhlóidithe graf scéimre atá feasach ar an gcomhphlé, agus díchódóir stáit feabhsaithe idirphlé le graf scéimre. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha ar thacair thacair thacair (i.e., SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, agus MultiWOZ2.2), go sáraíonn DSGFNet na modhanna atá ann cheana féin.", 'hu': 'A Dialogue State Tracking (DST) célja, hogy nyomon kövesse a felhasználók szándékait a beszélgetés során. A DST-ben még mindig alul tanulmányozott probléma a tartományok és a résidők közötti kapcsolatok modellezése. Az ilyen kapcsolatokat figyelembe vevő meglévő megközelítések általában hiányosak: (1) a korábbi résidő-tartomány tagsági kapcsolatok és a párbeszédtudatos dinamikus résidő-kapcsolatok kifejezetten egyesítésében, és (2) a láthatatlan területekre való általánosításban. Ezeknek a problémáknak a megoldására egy új \\textbf{D}dinamikus \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net} munkát javasolunk (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), amely dinamikus sémát hoz létre, hogy kifejezetten egyesítse a korábbi slot-domain tagsági kapcsolatokat és a párbeszéd-tudatos dinamikus slot kapcsolatokat. A sémákat arra is használja, hogy megkönnyítse az új területekre történő tudásátadást. A DSGFNet egy párbeszéd kimondási kódolóból, egy séma gráf kódolóból, egy párbeszéd-tudatos séma gráf fejlődő hálózatból és egy séma gráf fokozott párbeszéd állapot dekódolóból áll. A benchmark adatkészletek empirikus eredményei (azaz SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 és MultiWOZ2.2) azt mutatják, hogy a DSGFNet felülmúlja a meglévő módszereket.', 'el': 'Η παρακολούθηση κατάστασης διαλόγου έχει ως στόχο να παρακολουθεί τις προθέσεις των χρηστών κατά τη διάρκεια μιας συνομιλίας. Στην DST, η μοντελοποίηση των σχέσεων μεταξύ τομέων και χρονοθυρίδων εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί ανεπαρκές μελετημένο πρόβλημα. Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις που έχουν εξετάσει αυτές τις σχέσεις γενικά δεν επαρκούν όσον αφορά: (1) τη συγχώνευση προηγούμενων σχέσεων μέλους κουλοχέρηδων και δυναμικών σχέσεων κουλοχέρηδων που είναι ενήμεροι για διάλογο ρητά, και (2) τη γενίκευση σε μη ορατούς τομείς. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, προτείνουμε ένα νέο \\textbf{D}δυναμικό \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}fusion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), το οποίο παράγει ένα δυναμικό γράφημα για να συγχωνεύσει ρητά τις προηγούμενες σχέσεις μέλους κουλοχέρη-τομέα και τις δυναμικές σχέσεις κουλοχέρηδων που έχουν επίγνωση διαλόγου. Χρησιμοποιεί επίσης τα σχήματα για να διευκολύνει τη μεταφορά γνώσεων σε νέους τομείς. Το DSGFNet αποτελείται από έναν κωδικοποιητή εκφοράς διαλόγου, έναν κωδικοποιητή γραφήματος σχήματος, ένα δίκτυο ανάπτυξης γραφήματος σχήματος με επίγνωση διαλόγου και έναν αποκωδικοποιητή κατάστασης διαλόγου με βελτιωμένο γράφημα σχήματος. Εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς (δηλαδή SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 και MultiWOZ2.2), δείχνουν ότι το DSGFNet ξεπερνά τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους.', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სტატის შენახვა (DST) მიზეზია მომხმარებლის მიზეზების შენახვა პარამეტრების დროში. DST-ში მოდელირება კომენტების და კომენტების შორის პრობლემები უკეთესია. არსებობს მიღებები, რომლებიც აღმოჩნეთ ასეთი შესახებ, რომლებიც უბრალოდ კიდევ აღმოჩნდება: (1) პირველი პროტი-დომენის შესახებ და დიალოგის შესახებ დინამიკური პროტი შესახებ, და (2) ჯერალ ამ პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ მივიღებთ პრომენტი \\textbf{ D} ynamic\\\\ textbf{ S} chema\\\\ textbf{ G} raph\\\\ textbf{ F} გამოყენება \\textbf{ Net} work (\\ textbf{ DSGFNet}), რომელიც დინამიკური სქემა გრაფის შექმნა, რომელიც გამოსახულებით პირველი slot- domeinის შესახებ და დიალოგის დინა ის ასევე გამოყენებს სქემა, რომ ახალი დიომენში ცნობილების გადატვირთვას. DSGFNet იყო დიალოგის სიტყვების კოდერი, სქემა გრაფიკოდერი, დიალოგის შესახებ სქემა გრაფიკის განვითარება ქემა და სქემა გრაფიკის განვითარება დიალოგის სტატის განვითარე მომპერიკური მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ (მაგალითად, SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 და MultiWOZ2.2) გამოჩვენება, რომ DSGFNet არსებობს მიმდინარე მონაცემები.', 'lt': 'Dialogo valstybės sekimo (DST) tikslas – per pokalbį stebėti naudotojų ketinimus. DST srityje vis dar yra nepakankamai išnagrinėta problema modeliuoti santykius tarp sričių ir laiko tarpsnių. Existing approaches that have considered such relations generally fall short in: (1) fusing prior slot-domain membership relations and dialogue-aware dynamic slot relations explicitly, and (2) generalizing to unseen domains.  Siekiant išspręsti šiuos klausimus, siūlome naują \\textbf{D}dinamiką \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), kuri sukuria dinamišką schemos grafiką, kad aiškiai sujungtų ankstesnius narystės laiko tarpsniais ir laiko tarpsniais santykius bei dialogui žinomus dinamiškus laiko tarpsnių santykius. Ji taip pat naudoja schemas, kad palengvintų žinių perdavimą naujoms sritims. DSGFNet sudaro dialogo išraiškų koduotojas, schemos grafiko koduotojas, dialogo sąmoningas schemos grafiką plėtojantis tinklas ir schemos grafiką plėtojantis dialogo būklės koduotojas. Empiriniai lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių (t. y. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 ir MultiWOZ2.2) rezultatai rodo, kad DSGFNet viršija esamus metodus.', 'it': 'Dialogue State Tracking (DST) mira a tenere traccia delle intenzioni degli utenti durante il corso di una conversazione. Nel DST, modellare le relazioni tra domini e slot è ancora un problema poco studiato. Gli approcci esistenti che hanno preso in considerazione tali relazioni sono generalmente carenti in: (1) fusione esplicita di precedenti relazioni di appartenenza al dominio slot e relazioni dinamiche consapevoli del dialogo, e (2) generalizzazione a domini invisibili. Per risolvere questi problemi, proponiamo un nuovo lavoro \\textbf{D}dynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}, che genera uno schema grafico dinamico per fondere esplicitamente le precedenti relazioni di appartenenza al dominio slot e relazioni dinamiche di slot consapevoli del dialogo. Utilizza anche lo schema per facilitare il trasferimento di conoscenze a nuovi domini. DSGFNet è costituito da un encoder di pronuncia di dialogo, un encoder grafico di schema, una rete in evoluzione del grafico di schema consapevole del dialogo e un decoder di stato di dialogo migliorato grafico di schema. I risultati empirici sui set di dati benchmark (ad esempio SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 e MultiWOZ2.2), mostrano che DSGFNet supera i metodi esistenti.', 'kk': 'Диалог күйін қадағалау (DST) пайдаланушылардың мақсаттарын сұрақтау кезінде қадағалау мақсатты. DST-де домендер мен слоттар арасындағы қатынастарды моделдеу әлі оқылған мәселе. Бұл қатынастарды қалай қатынастар көбінесе қысқартылып тұрады: (1) алдыңғы слот- домендің бөлігі қатынастарын біріктіру мен диалогтың диалогтың динамикалық слот қатынастарын біріктіру, және (2) домендерге байланысты болмайд Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін біз\\ textbf {D} динамикалық\\ textbf {S} химикалық\\ textbf {G} raph\\ textbf {F} қолдануын\\ textbf {Net} work (\\ textbf {DSGFNet}) таңдаймыз. Бұл алдыңғы слот- домендің мүшелері мен диалогтың динамикалық слот қатынасын түсіндіру үшін динамикалық сұлбаны құрады. Бұл мәліметтерді жаңа доменге аудару үшін сұлбаны қолданады. DSGFNet диалогтың сөйлеу кодтамасы, сұлба график кодтамасы, диалогтың түсінікті сұлба графикасын өзгерту желінде және сұлба графикасының диалогтың күйін декодтамасы. Деректер жиындарының империялық нәтижелері (мысалы, SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 және MultiWOZ2.2) бар әдістерінің DSGFNet жоғарын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Дијалог Стејт следење (DST) има за цел да ги следи намерите на корисниците за време на разговорот. Во ДСТ, моделирањето на односите помеѓу домените и слотовите е сé уште недостаточно проучуван проблем. Постојачките пристапи кои ги сметаат ваквите односи генерално се скратени во: (1) спојувањето на претходните односи на членство со домен на слотови и дијалог-свесни динамични односи на слотови експлицитно, и (2) генерализација на невидени домени. За да ги решиме овие прашања, предлагаме роман \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), кој генерира динамичен шематски граф за експлицитно да ги спои претходните односи на членство слот-домен и дијалог-свесни динамични односи на слот. Исто така, ја користи шемата за олеснување на пренесувањето на знаење во нови домени. DSGFNet се состои од кодер за изрази на дијалогот, кодер за график со шема, мрежа за еволуирање на график со шема со свесност за дијалогот и декодер за состојба на дијалогот со зголемен график со шема. Импирските резултати на групите на податоци за споредба (т.е., SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 и MultiWOZ2.2), покажуваат дека DSGFNet ги надминува постоечките методи.', 'ms': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST) bermaksud untuk mengesan niat pengguna semasa perbualan. Dalam DST, pemodelan hubungan antara domain dan slot masih masalah yang tidak diteliti. Pendekatan yang wujud yang telah mempertimbangkan hubungan tersebut secara umum tersingkat dalam: (1) campur hubungan ahli slot-domain terdahulu dan hubungan slot dinamik yang sedar-dialog secara eksplicit, dan (2) menyebarkan ke domain yang tidak terlihat. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami cadangkan novel \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), yang menghasilkan graf skema dinamik untuk secara eksplicit menyala hubungan ahli slot-domain terdahulu dan hubungan slot dinamik yang sedar-dialog. Ia juga menggunakan skema untuk memudahkan pemindahan pengetahuan ke domain baru. DSGFNet terdiri dari pengekod ungkapan dialog, pengekod graf skema, rangkaian graf skema yang berkembang yang sedar-sedar dialog, dan pengekod keadaan dialog yang meningkat graf skema. Keputusan empirik pada set data benchmark (iaitu SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, dan MultiWOZ2.2), menunjukkan bahawa DSGFNet melampaui kaedah yang ada.', 'mt': "Id-Djalogu dwar it-Traċċar mill-Istat (DST) għandu l-għan li jżomm kont tal-intenzjonijiet tal-utenti matul konverżjoni. Fid-DST, l-immudellar tar-relazzjonijiet bejn id-dominji u s-slots għadu problema mhux studjata biżżejjed. L-approċċi eżistenti li kkunsidratu relazzjonijiet bħal dawn ġeneralment ma jaqgħux f’: (1) il-fużjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet ta’ sħubija preċedenti bejn is-slots u d-dominju ta’ sħubija u relazzjonijiet dinamiċi ta’ slots konxji mid-djalogu b’mod espliċitu, u (2) il-ġeneralizzazzjoni għal dominji mhux osservati. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, qed nipproponu grafika dinamika ġdida \\textbf{D}dinamika \\textbf{S}kima \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), li tiġġenera grafika dinamika ta' skema biex tiffuża espliċitament ir-relazzjonijiet ta' sħubija preċedenti bejn is-slot-domain u r-relazzjonijiet dinamiċi ta' slot li jkunu konxji mid-djalogu. Hija tuża wkoll l-iskemi biex tiffaċilita t-trasferiment tal-għarfien għal oqsma ġodda. DSGFNet tikkonsisti f’kodifikatur tal-espressjonijiet tad-djalogu, kodifikatur tal-grafika tal-iskema, netwerk li jevolvi l-grafika tal-iskema li jkun konxju mid-djalogu, u kodifikatur tal-istat tad-djalogu mtejjeb tal-grafika tal-iskema. Riżultati empiriċi dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji (jiġifieri SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, u MultiWOZ2.2), juru li DSGFNet tirrispetta metodi e żistenti.", 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന കാലത്ത് ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഉദ്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്ര ഡിഎസ്റ്റില്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനുകള്\u200dക്കും സ്ലോട്ടുകള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയിലെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് ഇപ്പോഴും പഠിച് സ്ലോട്ട്- ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d മെമ്മറിപ്പ് ബന്ധങ്ങളും സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് സ്ലോട്ട് ഡോമെന്\u200d ബന്ധങ്ങളും സ്ലോട്ട് അറിയുന്ന ഡൈനാമിക്ക് സ്ലോട്ട് ബന്ധങ് ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, മുമ്പ് സ്ലോട്ട്-ഡോമെന്\u200d മെമ്മെന്\u200dസ്റ്റ് ബന്ധങ്ങളും ഡയലോഗ് അറിയുന്ന ഡിസ്ക്ലോട്ട് ബന്ധങ്ങളും വ്യക്തമായി പ്രസ്താവിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d നോവല്\u200d {D} ടെക്സ്റ്റ്ബ്ബുക്ക് കീമാ {സ്കീമാ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അതും പുതിയ ഡൊമെയിനുകളിലേക്ക് ജ്ഞാനം മാറ്റുന്നതിന് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സ്കീമാതയാണ്. ഡിഎസ്ജിഎഫ്നെറ്റില്\u200d ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് വാക്ക് കോഡെര്\u200d, സ്കീമാ ഗ്രാഫ് കോഡെര്\u200d, ഡയലോഗ്- അറിയുന്ന സ്കീമാ സ്കീമാ വികസിക്കുന്ന നേറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റിലുള് ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d എമ്മിരിക്കല്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d (ഉദാ. SGD, MultiWOZ2. 1, MultiWOZ2. 2), നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d DSGFNet പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കു', 'no': 'Dialogtilstand- sporing (DST) måtar å halda spor på brukarar innstillingar under samtalen. I DST er det fortsatt eit understudiert problem å modellera forholdet mellom domene og plasser. Dei eksisterande tilnærmingane som har betrakte slike forbindelsane vanlegvis går kort i: (1) fyssering av førre medlemsstater for slot-domene og dialogoppmerking av dynamiske plasseringsrelasjonar eksplisisk, og (2) generelisering til ukjende domene. For å handsama desse problema, fører vi eit roman \\textbf{D} ynamikk \\textbf{S} kjemikema \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} usion \\textbf{Net} work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), som lagar eit dynamisk skjemagrafik for å eksplisisera forholdet til førre medlemsskap i slot- domene og dynamiske plass- forholdet med dialogvindauget. Det bruker også skjemaet for å gjere tilgjengeleg kunnskap overføring til nye domene. DSGFNet inneheld eit dialogteiknkoder, eit skjemagrafikkkoder, eit utviklingsgrafikk for dialogvindauge og eit utviklingsgrafikk for dialogvindauget. Empiriske resultat på benchmarkdatasett (t.d. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 og MultiWOZ2.2) viser at DSGFNet utfører eksisterande metodar.', 'mn': 'Диалог Улсын Холбоо (DST) нь хэрэглэгчийн зорилгоог ярилцлагын үед хадгалах зорилго юм. ДНХ-д орон нутгийн, слотын хоорондын харилцааны загвар загвар нь одоо ч судалгаагүй асуудал юм. Эдгээр харилцааны тухай ойлголт нь ерөнхийдөө богино байдаг: (1) аль хэдийн слот-домгийн гишүүн харилцааны холбоотой болон диалог-домжтой динамик слотын харилцааны холбоотой тодорхой харилцааны холбоотой, мөн (2) харилца Эдгээр асуудлуудыг олохын тулд бид \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}) шинэчлэлийг санал болно. Энэ нь өмнө нь слот-домгийн гишүүн харилцаа болон диалог ойлгох динамик слот харилцаа үүсгэдэг динамик схема график юм. Мөн мэдлэгийг шинэ хэсэгт шилжүүлэхэд ашигладаг. DSGFNet нь диалогын ярианы коддогч, схема график коддогч, диалогт ойлгомжтой схема график хөгжүүлэх сүлжээ болон схема график улам диалогын байр суурилуулагч байдаг. Банкомарк өгөгдлийн сангийн үр дүнг (т.е. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, MultiWOZ2.2), DSGFNet суурилсан аргыг гаргаж чаддаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Dialogue State Tracking (DST) ma na celu śledzenie intencji użytkowników w trakcie rozmowy. W czasie czasu zimowego modelowanie relacji między domenami i czasami na start lub lądowanie jest nadal niezbadanym problemem. Istniejące podejścia, które uwzględniały takie relacje, zazwyczaj brakują: (1) łączenia wcześniejszych relacji członkostwa członkostwa członkowskiego i dynamicznych relacji członkowskich świadomych dialogu oraz (2) uogólniania na niewidoczne domeny. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy nową chemę \\textbf{D}dynamiczną \\textbf{S}chemę \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), która generuje dynamiczny wykres schematu, aby wyraźnie połączyć poprzednie relacje członkostwa slot-domena i dynamiczne relacje slotowe świadome dialogu. Wykorzystuje również schematy do ułatwienia transferu wiedzy do nowych domen. DSGFNet składa się z kodera wypowiedzi dialogowej, kodera wykresu schematu, świadomego dialogu schematu wykresu ewoluującego sieć i dekodera stanu dialogowego z wykresem schematu. Wyniki empiryczne dotyczące zbiorów danych referencyjnych (tj. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 i MultiWOZ2.2) pokazują, że DSGFNet przewyższa istniejące metody.', 'ro': 'Urmărirea stării dialogului (DST) își propune să țină evidența intențiilor utilizatorilor în timpul conversației. În DST, modelarea relațiilor dintre domenii și sloturi este încă o problemă substudiată. Abordările existente care au luat în considerare astfel de relații sunt, în general, insuficiente în: (1) fuziunea explicită a relațiilor anterioare de apartenență la domeniul sloturilor și relațiilor dinamice sloturilor conștiente de dialog și (2) generalizarea la domenii nevăzute. Pentru a aborda aceste probleme, propunem o nouă lucrare \\textbf{D}dynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}, care generează un grafic dinamic de schemă pentru a fuziona explicit relațiile anterioare de membru slot-domeniu și relațiile dinamice slot-conștiente de dialog. De asemenea, utilizează schema pentru a facilita transferul de cunoștințe către noi domenii. DSGFNet constă dintr-un encoder de pronunțare a dialogului, un encoder de grafic de schemă, o rețea de evoluție a graficului de schemă conștientă de dialog și un decoder de stare de dialog îmbunătățit de grafic de schemă. Rezultatele empirice privind seturile de date de referință (adică SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 și MultiWOZ2.2), arată că DSGFNet depășește metodele existente.', 'sr': 'Državni praćenje dijaloga (DST) je cilj da prati namere korisnika tijekom razgovora. U DST-u, modeliranje odnosa među domenama i mestima još uvijek je pod studiranim problemom. Postoje pristupi koji su smatrali da se takvi odnosi obično kratki u: (1) spajanje odnosa o članstvu na slot-domenu i dinamičnih odnosa na slot-slot-u sa dijalogom jasno, i (2) generalizovanje na nevidljive domene. Za rješavanje tih pitanja, predlažemo roman \\textbf{D} dinamični \\textbf{S} keme \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} upotrebu \\textbf{Net} work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), koji stvara dinamični grafik šeme kako bi se pojasno uključio odnose o članstvu na prednju slot domenu i odnose o dinamičnom slotu svjesnom dijalogu. Takođe koristi šemu da olakša transfer znanja u nove domene. DSGFNet se sastoji od kodera izraza dijaloga, kodera šeme grafika, razvijajući mrežu grafika šeme koje znaju dijalog, i povećanog dekodera stanja dijaloga. Empirički rezultati na setima podataka o referenciji (tj. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 i MultiWOZ2.2), pokazuju da DSGFNet iznosi postojeće metode.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada dowladda (DST) waxaa loogu talagalay in uu raaco qasnadaha isticmaalayaasha marka lagu jiro sameynta hadalka. Dalka DST, sameynta xiriirka degmooyinka iyo daryeelka degmooyinka ayaa weli ka mid ah dhibaato wax lagu baranayo. Dhaqdooyinka joogta ah oo ka fikiray xiriirka caynkaas ah sida caadiga ah ay u gaaban yihiin: (1) ka hor imaanaya xiriirka xubnaha ee slot-domain iyo xiriirka dialog-aware dynamic slot, iyo (2) si cad u muuqata meelaha qarsoon. Si aan ula macaamiloono arimahan, waxaan u soo jeedinnaa warqad qoraal dhaqdhaqaaqsan/textbf {S} chema /textbf {G} raph /textbf {F} work (textbf {DSGFNet}), kaas oo muujiyaa sawir dynamic schema ah si bayaan ugu fududaysa xiriirka xubnaha ee hore ee slot-domain iyo dialog-aware dynamic slot. It also uses the schemata to facilitate knowledge transfer to new domains.  DSGFNet waxaa ka mid ah qoraal ku qoran hadal ku hadla, codsiga qoraalka ee schema, shabakadda qoraalka qoraalka oo aqoonsan, iyo sawir qoraal ah oo horumarinaya qoraalka dowladda. Qiimaha jimicsiga ah e e ku saabsan sawirada benchmark (i.e. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, iyo MultiWOZ2.2), waxaad muujisaa in DSGFNet uu sameeyo qaababka joogta ah.', 'si': 'සංවාදය ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය (DST) අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ අදහස් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා කතාවක් වලට. DST වලින්, ඩෝමේන්ස් සහ ස්ලෝට් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තාමත් අඩු අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා. Existiting approach that have seen this link generouvely fell short in: (1) fusing pre-slot-domain memership ties and dialog-knowing inactive slot ties expressly, and (2) General lizing to unseen domeins. මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් \\textbf{D} ynamik \\textbf{S} chema \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} Uson \\textbf{Net} job (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්කීමා ග්\u200dරාෆ් වෙන්න පුළුවන් slot-domain member ties and dialog-know ඒකෙන් අලුත් ඩෝමේන් වලට දන්නවන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සහාය කරන්න ස්කීමාත්මය පාවිච්චි කරනවා. DSGFNet එක්ක සංවාද කිරීම් කෝඩාර්කයක්, ස්කීමා ග්\u200dරාෆ් කෝඩාර්කයක්, සංවාද දැනගන්න ස්කීමා ග්\u200dරාෆ් විකෘතිය ජාලය, සහ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Dialogtillståndsspårning (DST) syftar till att hålla reda på användarnas avsikter under samtalets gång. Inom DST är modellering av relationerna mellan domäner och slots fortfarande ett understuderat problem. Befintliga tillvägagångssätt som har beaktat sådana förbindelser saknar generellt följande: (1) att uttryckligen sammanföra tidigare förbindelser med medlemskapet mellan slots och dialogmedvetna dynamiska slots-relationer, och (2) att generalisera till osynliga domäner. För att ta itu med dessa problem föreslår vi ett nytt \\textbf{D}dynamiskt \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net} arbete (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), som genererar en dynamisk schemagraf för att uttryckligen sammanföra de tidigare medlemsförhållandena mellan slots och dialogmedvetna dynamiska slots-relationer. Den använder också schemat för att underlätta kunskapsöverföring till nya domäner. DSGFNet består av en dialoguttalningskodare, en schemagrafkodare, ett dialogmedvetet schemagrafutvecklande nätverk och en schemagrafförbättrad dialogtillståndsdekodare. Empiriska resultat på benchmarkdatauppsättningar (dvs SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 och MultiWOZ2.2) visar att DSGFNet överträffar befintliga metoder.', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் நாட்டு பின்பற்றி (DST) உரையாடல் பேச்சின் காலத்தில் பயனர் இலக்குகளை பாதுகாக்குவதற்கு தெரியும். டிஎஸ்டில் உள்ள களங்கள் மற்றும் சட்டங்களில் உள்ள தொடர்புகளை மாதிரிப்பது இன்னும் படிக்கப்பட்ட பிரச்சனை இவ்வாறு இணைப்புகள் பொதுவாக குறைந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் நிகழ்வுகள் உள்ளன: (1) முன்னால் செருகு- டோமைன் உறுப்பினர் தொடர்புகள் மற்றும் உரையாடல் அறிந்து கொள இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை விளக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய புத்தகத்தை {D} உரையாடல் புத்தகம் {S} கைமா /textbf {G} raph {textbf} வலைப்பு (\\textbf {DSGFNet}) வரைபடத்தை உருவாக்குகிறது, முன்னோடு செருகுவாய்வு டோமைன் உறுப்பினர் இணைப்புகளை வெளிப்படையாக இதும் புதிய தளங்களுக்கு அறிவு மாற்றுதலை பயன்படுத்தும் திட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. Name பென்க்மேக் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் வெற்றிகரமான முடிவுகள் (அதாவது, SGD, MultiWOZ2. 1, மற்றும் MultiWOZ2. 2), DSGFNet நடப்பு முறைகளை வெளியேற்றும் என்பதை கா', 'ur': 'Dialogue State Tracking (DST) کا ارادہ یہ ہے کہ ایک صحبت کے طول میں کارساز کے ارادہ کو ترک کریں. ڈیس ٹی میں، ڈیمین اور لٹ کے درمیان رابطہ کی مدل کرنا یہاں تک بھی کم تحقیق کی مشکل ہے. موجود طریقے ہیں جن کو یہ رابطہ سمجھ لیا گیا ہے (1) پہلے اسلوٹ-ڈومین جماعت رابطہ اور ڈیلوٹ-آگاہ داینمانیک اسلوٹ رابطہ صریح طور پر جمع کرنا اور (2) غیب کے دامنوں پر جمع کرنا۔ ہم نے ان مسائلیوں کے بارے میں ایک نوم \\textbf{D} ynamic \\textbf{S} chema \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} usion \\textbf{Net} work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}) کی پیش کی slot-domain متحدی رابطے اور ڈینال-جانے کی داینمانیک اسلوٹ رابطے کو مفصل کرنے کے لئے پیدا کیا ہے. اس طرح طرح کا استعمال کرتا ہے تاکہ علم کو نئی دامنوں میں ترافیس آسان کرے۔ DSGFNet ایک диалог کی بات کوڈر ہے، ایک سیمیا گراف کوڈر ہے، ایک ڈیلوگو جانے والی سیمیا گراف تکامل نیٹ ورک، اور ایک سیمیا گراف بہترین ڈیلوگو سٹیٹ ڈکوڈر ہے. بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ (یعنی SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 اور MultiWOZ2.2) پر مصریح نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ DSGFNet موجود طریقے سے زیادہ اجرا کرتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Name Name Bu aloqalarni umuman qisqa deb tasavvur qiladigan holatlar: (1) slot- domen membership aloqalaridan oldin kelib chiqish va muloqat taʼminlovchi dynamik aloqa bilan bogʻliq aloqa bilan ajratish va (2) yomon domenega yaratish. Bu muammolarni talab qilish uchun biz oldingi slot- domen membership ulanishlarini va dialog bilan taʼminlovchi dynamik slayd ulanishini aniqlash uchun novel /textbf {D} textbf {textbf} chema / {textbf {F} orqali / {textbf {DSGFNet}) yaratamiz. Bu yana yangi domeyga ilmiy uzilishni foydalanadi. Name Name', 'vi': 'Tìm kiếm tình trạng trao đổi (DST) để theo dõi ý định của người dùng trong suốt cuộc trò chuyện. Trong DSS, mô hình các mối quan hệ giữa lãnh vực và các khe hở vẫn là một vấn đề chưa được nghiên cứu. Các phương pháp hiện thời đã xem xét những mối quan hệ như vậy thường không đạt được: 1) phác thảo các mối quan hệ thành lập lâu đài và quan hệ tốc độ đối thoại rõ ràng, và (2) tổng hợp cho miền không nhìn thấy. Để giải quyết các vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một tiểu thuyết (\\ textbf(D) amimo (\\\\ textbf(G))}\\ textbf(F) tràn dịch (\\ textbf) (mạng) làm việc (\\ textbf(Net), tạo ra một giản đồ động để tổng hợp các quan hệ thành lập lâu đài kịp thời và-nhận thức các mối quan hệ nhịp trống. Nó cũng dùng bản đồ để dễ dàng chuyển tri thức sang những miền mới. Bộ mã hóa phát ngôn ngữ xã hội, bộ mã hóa đồ thị giản đồ, bộ mã hóa đồ giản đồ, bộ đồ thị xã hội tiến hóa mạng lưới, và bộ giải mã cấu hình đồ thị khuếch đại âm giản đồ. Các kết quả chính xác về các tập tin tiêu chuẩn (tức là SGD, MulWOZ2.1 và MulWOZ2.2) cho thấy rằng DSS vượt trội các phương pháp tồn tại.', 'bg': 'Проследяването на състоянието на диалога има за цел да следи намеренията на потребителите по време на разговора. В ДСТ моделирането на отношенията между домейните и слотовете все още е недостатъчно проучен проблем. Съществуващите подходи, които са разглеждали такива отношения, обикновено не достигат до: (1) сливане на предишни отношения на членство в слот домейн и динамични слот отношения, осъзнаващи диалога, изрично, и (2) обобщаване към невидими домейни. За да се справим с тези проблеми, ние предлагаме нов \\textbf{D}динамичен \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}раф \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}работа (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), който генерира динамична схема графика, която изрично слива предишните връзки за членство в слот-домейн и динамични слот релации, съобразени с диалога. Той също така използва схемите, за да улесни трансфера на знания към нови области. DSGFNet се състои от диалогов кодер за изказване, схемен кодер за графика, диалогов научен схемен графика, развиваща се мрежа, и схемен графика, подобрен диалогов декодер за състояние. Емпиричните резултати от сравнителните набори от данни (т.е., SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 и MultiWOZ2.2) показват, че DSGFNet превъзхожда съществуващите методи.', 'da': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST) har til formål at holde styr på brugernes intentioner i løbet af en samtale. I DST er modellering af relationerne mellem domæner og slots stadig et underundersøgt problem. Eksisterende fremgangsmåder, der har taget hensyn til sådanne forbindelser, mangler generelt: (1) eksplicit sammenblanding af tidligere forbindelser med medlemskab af slotsområder og dialogbevidste dynamiske slotsområder, og (2) generalisering til usete domæner. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi en ny \\textbf{D}dynamisk \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net} arbejde (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), som genererer en dynamisk skema graf til eksplicit at fusionere de tidligere slot-domæne medlemsrelationer og dialog-bevidste dynamiske slot relationer. Den bruger også skemaet til at lette vidensoverførsel til nye domæner. DSGFNet består af en dialog ytrance encoder, en skema graf encoder, et dialogbevidst skema graf udvikling netværk, og en skema graf forbedret dialog state dekoder. Empiriske resultater på benchmark datasæt (dvs. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 og MultiWOZ2.2) viser, at DSGFNet overgår eksisterende metoder.', 'hr': 'Državno praćenje dijaloga (DST) ima cilj pratiti namjere korisnika tijekom razgovora. U DST-u modeliranje odnosa između domena i mjesta još uvijek je pod ispitivanjem problem. Postoje pristupi koji su smatrali takvim odnosima obično kratki u: (1) spajanje odnosa o članstvu na slot-domenu i dinamičnih odnosa na slot-slot-u s dijalogom jasno, te (2) generaliziranje na nevidljive domene. Za rješavanje tih pitanja, predlažemo roman \\textbf{D} dinamični \\textbf{S} kemije \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} uporabu \\textbf{Net} work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), koji stvara dinamični grafik scheme kako bi se pojasno uključio odnose o članstvu u prednju slot domenu i odnose o dinamičnom slotu svjesnom dijalogu. Također koristi schemu kako bi olakšala transfer znanja u nove domene. DSGFNet se sastoji od kodera izraza dijaloga, kodera grafika scheme, grafika razvijajuće mrežu s dijalogom svjesnog dijaloga i grafika povećanog dekodera stanja dijaloga. Empirički rezultati na standardnim setima podataka (tj. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 i MultiWOZ2.2), pokazuju da DSGFNet iznosi postojeće metode.', 'nl': "Dialogue State Tracking (DST) is bedoeld om de intenties van gebruikers tijdens een gesprek bij te houden. In DST is het modelleren van de relaties tussen domeinen en slots nog steeds een onderbestudeerd probleem. Bestaande benaderingen die dergelijke relaties hebben overwogen, schieten over het algemeen tekort in: (1) het expliciet samenvoegen van eerdere slot-domein-lidmaatschapsrelaties en dialoogbewuste dynamische slot-relaties, en (2) het generaliseren naar onzichtbare domeinen. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw \\textbf{D}dynamisch \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}werk (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), dat een dynamische schema grafiek genereert om expliciet de eerdere slot-domein lidmaatschap relaties en dialoogbewuste dynamische slot relaties te fuseren. Het maakt ook gebruik van de schema's om kennisoverdracht naar nieuwe domeinen te vergemakkelijken. DSGFNet bestaat uit een dialoog uiting encoder, een schema grafiek encoder, een dialoog bewust schema grafiek evoluerend netwerk, en een schema grafiek verbeterde dialoog state decoder. Empirische resultaten op benchmark datasets (SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 en MultiWOZ2.2) tonen aan dat DSGFNet beter presteert dan bestaande methoden.", 'de': 'Dialogue State Tracking (DST) zielt darauf ab, die Absichten der Nutzer während eines Gesprächs zu verfolgen. In der Sommerzeit ist die Modellierung der Beziehungen zwischen Domänen und Zeitnischen immer noch ein wenig erforschtes Problem. Bestehende Ansätze, die solche Beziehungen berücksichtigt haben, sind in der Regel unzureichend: (1) die explizite Verschmelzung vorheriger Slot-Domain-Mitgliedsbeziehungen und dialogbewusster dynamischer Slot-Beziehungen und (2) die Verallgemeinerung auf unsichtbare Domains. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neuartiges \\textbf{D}dynamisches \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}) vor, das ein dynamisches Schema erzeugt, um die vorherigen Slot-Domain-Mitgliedsbeziehungen und dialogbewusste dynamische Slot-Beziehungen explizit zu verschmelzen. Es nutzt die Schemata auch, um den Wissenstransfer in neue Domänen zu erleichtern. DSGFNet besteht aus einem Dialog Äußerungskodierer, einem Schema Graph Encoder, einem dialogbewussten Schema Graph entwickelnden Netzwerk und einem Schema Graph Enhanced Dialogstatus Decoder. Empirische Ergebnisse auf Benchmark-Datensätzen (z.B. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 und MultiWOZ2.2) zeigen, dass DSGFNet bestehende Methoden übertrifft.', 'id': 'Dialog State Tracking (DST) bermaksud untuk melacak niat pengguna selama percakapan. Dalam DST, model hubungan antara domain dan slot masih merupakan masalah yang belum dipelajari. Pendekatan yang ada yang telah mempertimbangkan hubungan tersebut secara umum menjadi pendek dalam: (1) fusing prior slot-domain membership relations and dialogue-aware dynamic slot relations explicitly, and (2) generalizing to unseen domains. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah novel \\textbf{D}dinamik \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), yang menghasilkan grafik skema dinamik untuk secara eksplicit menggabungkan hubungan anggota slot-domain sebelumnya dan hubungan slot dinamik yang sadar dialog. Ini juga menggunakan skema untuk memudahkan transfer pengetahuan ke domain baru. DSGFNet terdiri dari pengkode ungkapan dialog, pengkode grafik skema, jaringan grafik skema yang berkembang yang sadar dialog, dan pengkode keadaan dialog yang meningkat grafik skema. Hasil imperial pada set data benchmark (i.e., SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, dan MultiWOZ2.2), menunjukkan bahwa DSGFNet melampaui metode yang ada.', 'sw': 'Ufuatiliaji wa Taifa la Dialogue (DST) unalenga kuendelea kufuatilia nia ya watumiaji wakati wa mazungumzo. Nchini DST, kutengeneza mahusiano kati ya maeneo na mistari bado ni tatizo lililosomwa. Existing approaches that have considered such relations generally fall short in: (1) fusing prior slot-domain membership relations and dialogue-aware dynamic slot relations explicitly, and (2) generalizing to unseen domains.  Ili kukabiliana na masuala haya, tunapendekeza riwaya ya kitabu {D} kimaadili {textbook} chema \\textbf {G} ubakaji \\textbf {F} wizara \\textbook {textbook {DSGFNet}) kazi ya mtandao (\\textbook {DSGFNet}), ambayo inatengeneza picha ya msimamo mzuri ili kuondoa wazi kuhusu mahusiano ya wanachama wa ndani na mahusiano ya mazungumzo yanayofahamika na mazungumzo yanayohusiana na mazungumzo yanayofahamika. Pia inatumia mpango wa kusaidia uhamishaji wa maarifa kwa maeneo mapya. DSGFNet ina kodi ya mazungumzo ya mazungumzo, kodi ya ramani ya mpango, ramani ya mpango wa mazungumzo inayofahamika na mjadala inayoendelea mtandaoni, na mpango wa ramani unaoongezeka kwa kuongezeka kwa hali ya mazungumzo. Matokeo ya kipekee kwenye seti za benchmark (yaani SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, na MultiWOZ2.2), yanaonyesha kuwa DSGFNet inafanya mbinu zilizopo.', 'ko': '대화 상태 추적(DST)은 대화 도중 사용자의 의도를 추적하기 위한 것입니다.DST에서 도메인과 간격 사이의 관계 모델링은 여전히 연구해야 할 문제이다.기존의 이러한 관계를 고려하는 방법은 일반적으로 다음과 같은 측면에서 부족하다. (1) 이전의 틈새역 구성원 관계와 대화 감지의 동적 틈새 관계를 명확하게 융합시키고 (2) 보이지 않는 영역으로 확대한다.이러한 문제점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 \\textbf{D}동적\\textbf{S}chema\\textbf{G}그림\\textbf{F}융합\\textbf{Net}작업(\\textbf{DSGFNet})을 제시했다. 이것은 동적 모드맵을 생성하여 이전의 틈새역 구성원 관계와 대화가 감지하는 동적 틈새 관계를 현저하게 융합시킨다.그것은 또 도식을 사용하여 지식이 새로운 영역으로 이동하는 것을 촉진한다.DSGFNet은 대화 언어 인코더, 모드 그래프 인코더, 대화 감지 모드 그래프 진화 네트워크, 모드 그래프가 강화된 대화 상태 인코더로 구성되어 있다.기준 데이터 집합(즉 SGD,MultiWOZ2.1,MultiWOZ2.2)에 대한 실증 결과에 따르면 DSGFNet은 기존 방법보다 우수하다.', 'fa': 'ردیابی وضعیت محاوره (DST) هدف دارد که در طول یک مکالمه هدف کاربران را ردیابی کند. در DST، مدل کردن رابطه\u200cهای بین دامنه\u200cها و نقطه\u200cها هنوز یک مشکل زیر مطالعه است. روش\u200cهای موجود که این رابطه\u200cها معمولاً کوتاه می\u200cشوند: (۱) رابطه\u200cهای اعضای مجموعه\u200cی نقطه\u200cی نقطه\u200cی قبلی و رابطه\u200cهای نقطه\u200cی دینامیکی را با مشاهده\u200cی گفتگو مشخص می\u200cکنند، و (۲) عمومی به دامنه\u200cهای غ برای حل این مسائل، ما یک روزنامه \\textbf{D} ynamic \\textbf{S} chema\\ textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} استفاده از استفاده \\textbf{Net} work (\\ textbf{DSGFNet}) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک نقشه\u200cای دینامیک را ایجاد می\u200cکند تا مشخص رابطه\u200cهای اعضای پیشینیان slot-domain و رابطه\u200cهای نقطه\u200cای دینامیک را آگاه کند. همچنین از برنامه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند تا تغییر علم به دامنهای جدید آسان کند. DSGFNet consists of a dialog utterance encoder, a schema graph encoder, a dialog-aware schema graph evolving network, and a schema graph enhanced dialog decoder. نتایج امپراتیک روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مقدار (که می\u200cگویند: SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 و MultiWOZ2.2) نشان می\u200cدهد که DSGFNet روش\u200cهای موجود را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': "диалог Durum İzlenmesi (DST) ullançylaryň niýetlerini çykarmak üçin amaçlarýar. DST'de, sahalar we ýerler arasyndaky baglaýyşlary düzenlemek heniz öwrenmeli mesele däldir. Böyle baglaýyşlary diýip pikir eden bar ýakynlaşylar (1) slot-domenyň üýtgetmeli baglaýyşlaryny bilen birleşdirmek we dialogdan tanyş dynamik slot baglaýyşlaryny belli şekilde, we (2) görnüş sahypalara döredilýär. Bu meselelerden çözmek üçin biz \\textbf{D}ynamik \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}uzanyş \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}) täze bir romany teklip edip, bu da ilkinji slot-domenyň üýtgenleri we dynamik slot baglaýyşlaryny çykarýar. Bu ýerde bilim üýtgewini täze alana kömek etmek üçin sahypalary ulanýar. DSGFNet bir dijalog sözleşme kodçysynda, bir şema grafik kodçysynda, bir dijalogdan haberdar bir şema grafiki gelişirip a ňladýar we bir şema grafiki gelişirip dýalogyň durum kodçysynda bar. Empirik netijesi benchmark veri setirlerinde (meselâ, SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 we MultiWOZ2.2), DSGFNet bolan yönlerden çykarýandygyny görkez.", 'af': "Dialoog Staat Volg (DST) doel om snit van gebruikers se intensies te hou tydens die loop van 'n gesprekslys. In DST is die modellering van die relasies tussen domeine en slote nog 'n ondersteunde probleem. Bestaande toegange wat sodanige verwantings generellik oorweeg het, val kort in: (1) afsluiting voor slot-domein-mededingsrelasies en dialoog-bevestig dinamiese slot-relasies uitduidelik, en (2) generelisering na onverstaan domeine. Om hierdie probleme te raak, voorstel ons 'n roman \\textbf{D} dinamike \\textbf{S} kema \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} usie \\textbf{Net} werk (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), wat genereer 'n dinamike skema graaf om die voorheede slot- domein ledelskap relasies en dialoog- awarene dinamike slot relasies te fys. Dit gebruik ook die skema om kennis oordrag na nuwe domeine te maak. DSGFNet bestaan van 'n dialoog uitspraak enkoder, 'n skema graaf enkoder, 'n dialoog- bewys skema graaf wat ontwikkeling netwerk en 'n skema graaf verbeterde dialoog staat dekoder. Enige resultate op benchmark datastelle (bv. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 en MultiWOZ2.2), vertoon dat DSGFNet bestaande metodes uitvoer.", 'am': "የDialog State Tracking (DST) በመግለጫው ወቅት የተጠቃሚዎችን አሳብ ለመጠበቅ ነው፡፡ በDST ውስጥ በሀገር እና ስርዓቶች መካከል ግንኙነትን በመምሰል ግን በተማረ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በጠቅላላ አቋራጭ:(1) አስቀድሞ የslot-domain አባል ግንኙነት እና dialog-ታዋቂው dynamic slot ግንኙነት በግልጽ እና (2) ወደ ውይይት ድሆች አወራጅቷል፡፡ እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለማግኘት የጽሑፍ የጽሑፍ/textbf {S} chema\\textbf {G} raph\\textbf {F} work (\\textbf {DSGFNet}) እና የቀድሞው የድምፅ ስርዓት ግንኙነትን እና የdialog-ታዋቂው dynamic slot ግንኙነቶችን ገልጽ ለማግለጥ እና ማስታወቂያ. እውቀትን ለመለወጥ አዲስ ዶሜኖችን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ DSGFNet consists of a dialogue utterance encoder, a schema graph encoder, a dialogue-aware schema graph evolving network, and a schema graph enhanced dialogue state decoder.  ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Առաջին դասախոսությունը (DST) նպատակով է հետևել օգտագործողների մտադրությունները խոսակցության ընթացքում: DST-ում դեռևս թերուսումնասիրված խնդիր է դասակարգման հարաբերությունները բնագավառների և վայրերի միջև: Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները, որոնք համարում են նման հարաբերություններ, ընդհանուր առմամբ կարճ են ընկնում: (1) նախորդ անվայրի-տիեզերքի անդամների հարաբերությունների միավորումը և դինամիկ անվայրի դինամիկ հարաբերությունները բացատրականորեն, և (2) ըն Այս խնդիրների լուծման համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր \\TexBf{D}դինամիկ \\TexBf{S}քիմիա \\TexBf{G}գրաֆ \\TexBf{F}ուզիա \\TexBf{Net}աշխատանք (\\TexBf{DSGSGNNet}), որը ստեղծում է դինամիկ սխեմային գրաֆիա, որպեսզի բացահայտորեն միացնենք նախորդ անդամների և վայրերի անդամների հարաբերությունները և դինամիկ անդամների հարաբերությունները,  Այն նաև օգտագործում է սխեմատները գիտելիքների փոխանցման նոր ոլորտների համար: DSGPNet-ը կազմում է երկխոսային արտահայտությունների կոդեր, սխեմային գրաֆիկի կոդեր, երկխոսային գրաֆիկի զարգացող ցանց և սխեմային գրաֆիկի բարելավված երկխոսային վիճակի կոդեր: Իմպերիկական արդյունքները համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի վրա (այսինքն, ՍԳԴ, Մուլիվոզ2.1 և Մուլիվոզ2.2) ցույց են տալիս, որ DSGPNet-ը գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները:', 'az': 'Dialog Eyaleti ńįzl…ôm…ôsi (DST) istifad…ô√ßil…ôrin niyy…ôtl…ôrini m√ľzakir…ô etm…ôk ist…ôyir. DST-d…ô, domenalar v…ô slotlar arasńĪndakńĪ iliŇükil…ôri modell…ôŇüdirm…ôk h…ôl…ô d…ô aŇüańüńĪ t…ôhsil edil…ôn problemdir. B√ľt√ľn bu iliŇükiler genellikle qńĪsa hesab etdikl…ôri t…ôrzl…ôrin: 1) …ôvv…ôlki slot-domain √ľyelik iliŇükilerini birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk v…ô dialogdan tanńĪdńĪqlarńĪ dinamik slot iliŇükilerini a√ßńĪq-aydńĪn bildirm…ôk v…ô 2) g√∂rm…ôdikl…ôri domenalara genellik g√∂st…ôrilm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn. Bu m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôrd…ôn √ß…ôkinm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, biz yeni \\textbf{D} ynamik \\textbf{S} chema \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} vasit…ôsil…ô \\textbf{Net} work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}) t…ôklif edirik. Bu, …ôvv…ôlki slot-domain √ľyelik …ôlaq…ôl…ôrini v…ô dialogdan x…ôb…ôrdar dinamik slot …ôlaq…ôl…ôrini a √ßńĪq-aŇükar birl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn dinamik bir schema grafńĪnńĪ yaradńĪr. H…ôm√ßinin bu schematńĪ yeni domenalara elm almasńĪnńĪ asanlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edir. DSGFNet dijalog s√∂zl…ôri kodlayńĪcńĪsńĪdńĪr, schema grafńĪ kodlayńĪcńĪsńĪdńĪr, dialog-aware schema grafńĪ geliŇümiŇü Ňü…ôb…ôk…ôsind…ôn v…ô schema grafńĪndan daha y√ľks…ôk dijalog durumu kodlayńĪcńĪsńĪdńĪr. Benchmark veri qurńüularńĪnńĪn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn sonu√ßlarńĪ (i.e. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 v…ô MultiWOZ2.2) g√∂st…ôrir ki, DSGFNet mevcut metodlarńĪn √ľst√ľnl√ľy√ľn√ľ g√∂st…ôrir.', 'bs': 'Državni praćenje dijaloga (DST) je cilj pratiti namere korisnika tijekom razgovora. U DST-u modeliranje odnosa među domenama i mjestima još uvijek je problem pod ispitivanjem. Postoje pristupi koji su smatrali da se takvi odnosi obično kratki u: (1) spajanje prethodnih odnosa članstva u domenu slota i dinamičnih odnosa na mjestu slota koji se pojavljuju na dijalogu, i (2) generaliziranje na nevidljive domene. D a bi se riješili ovih pitanja, predlažemo roman \\textbf{D} dinamični \\textbf{S} keme \\textbf{G} raph \\textbf{F} upotrebu \\textbf{Net} work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), koji stvara dinamični grafik scheme kako bi se pojasno uključio odnose o članstvu na prednju slot domenu i odnose o dinamičnom slotu svjesnom dijalogu. Također koristi schemu kako bi olakšao transfer znanja na nove domene. DSGFNet se sastoji od kodera izraza dijaloga, kodera scheme grafika, grafika razvijajuće mrežu scheme svijesti dijaloga, i grafika povećanog dekodera stanja dijaloga. Empirički rezultati na standardnim setima podataka (tj. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 i MultiWOZ2.2), pokazuju da DSGFNet iznosi postojeće metode.', 'bn': "Dialogue State Tracking (DST) aims to keep track of users' intentions during the course of a conversation.  ডিএসটিতে ডোমেন এবং স্লোটের মধ্যে সম্পর্কের মডেল করা এখনো পরিচিত সমস্যা। বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি যারা এরকম সম্পর্ক সাধারণত কমে যাচ্ছে: (১) স্লোট-ডোমেইনের সদস্য সম্পর্ক এবং আলোচনার সাথে সচেতন ডায়ালগ স্লোনামিক সম্পর্ক স্পল্যাট সম্পর্ক স্ এই সমস্ত ব্যাপারগুলোর বিষয়গুলোর সাথে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি {D} টেক্সটব্লোট-ডোমেইনের সদস্যদের সম্পর্ক এবং ডায়ালগ-সচেতন ডায়ালগ স্লোডামিক সম্পর্ক ব্যর্থ করার জন্য একটি ডায়ামিক স্কীমা গ্রাফ তৈরি করি। এটি নতুন ডোমেইনে জ্ঞান পরিবর্তনের জন্য স্কীমাটা ব্যবহার করে। Name বেনকম্যার্ক ডাটাসেট (যেমন SGD, MultiWOZ2. 1, এবং MultiWOZ2. 2) সম্মানিত ফলাফল দেখাও যে DSGFNet বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতিগুলো প্রদর্শন করে।", 'ca': "Dialogue State Tracking (DST) té l'objectiu de seguir les intencions dels usuaris durant una conversa. En DST, modelar les relacions entre dominis i slots encara és un problema poc estudiat. Els enfocaments existents que han considerat aquestes relacions generalment es redueixen en: (1) fusionar explícitament les relacions anteriors d'adhesió a dominis de slots i relacions dinàmiques de slots conscients del diàleg, i (2) generalitzar-se a dominis invisibles. Per abordar aquests problemes, proposem una nova \\textbf{D}dinàmica \\textbf{S}química \\textbf{G}raf \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), que genera un gràfic d'esquema dinàmic per fusionar explícitament les relacions anteriors d'integració slot-domini i de diàleg dinàmica de slot. També utilitza els esquemes per facilitar la transfer ència del coneixement a nous dominis. DSGFNet consisteix en un codificador d'expressions de diàleg, un codificador de gràfics d'esquema, una xarxa en evolució de gràfics d'esquema conscient de diàleg i un codificador d'estat de diàleg millorat de gràfics d'esquema. Els resultats empírics dels conjunts de dades de referència (SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 i MultiWOZ2.2), mostren que DSGFNet supera els mètodes existents.", 'cs': 'Sledování stavu dialogu (DST) má za cíl sledovat záměry uživatelů během konverzace. V letním období je modelování vztahů mezi doménami a sloty stále málo studovaným problémem. Stávající přístupy, které tyto vztahy zohlednily, obecně nedostatečně při: (1) sloučení předchozích vztahů členství slot-domény a dynamických vztahů slot-vědomých explicitně a (2) zobecnění na neviditelné domény. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme nový \\textbf{D}dynamický \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), který generuje dynamický schématický graf, který explicitně sloučí předchozí členské vztahy slotové domény a dialogové dynamické slotové vztahy. Využívá schémata také k usnadnění přenosu znalostí do nových domén. DSGFNet se skládá z kodéru dialogových výrazů, kodéru schématu grafu, dialogového grafu grafu vyvíjející se síť a schématu grafu rozšířeného dekódu stavu dialogu. Empirické výsledky referenčních datových sad (tj. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 a MultiWOZ2.2) ukazují, že DSGFNet překonává stávající metody.', 'et': 'Dialoogi oleku jälgimise (DST) eesmärk on jälgida kasutajate kavatsusi vestluse käigus. DST-s on domeenide ja teenindusaegade suhete modelleerimine endiselt alauuritud probleem. Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid, mis on selliseid suhteid käsitlenud, jäävad üldjuhul puudulikuks: (1) varasemate teenindusaegade liikmesussuhete ja dialoogiteadlike dünaamiliste teenindusaegade suhete selgesõnaliselt ühendamisel ning (2) nähtamatutele valdkondadele üldistamisel. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja uue \\textbf{D}dünaamilise \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usioon \\textbf{Net}töö (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), mis genereerib dünaamilise skeemigraafiku, mis ühendab selgesõnaliselt eelnevad teenindusaegade ja dialoogiteadlikud dünaamilised teenindusaegade suhted. Samuti kasutab ta skeeme, et hõlbustada teadmiste edasiandmist uutesse valdkondadesse. DSGFNet koosneb dialoogi väljenduskodeerijast, skeemigraafiku kodeerijast, dialoogiteadlikust skeemigraafiku arenevast võrgust ja skeemigraafiku täiustatud dialoogi oleku dekoodrist. Võrdlusandmekogumite (st SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 ja MultiWOZ2.2) empiirilised tulemused näitavad, et DSGFNet ületab olemasolevaid meetodeid.', 'fi': 'Dialogue State Tracking (DST) pyrkii seuraamaan käyttäjien aikeita keskustelun aikana. DST:ssä verkkotunnusten ja lähtö- ja saapumisaikojen välisten suhteiden mallintaminen on vielä vähän tutkittu ongelma. Nykyiset lähestymistavat, joissa tällaisia suhteita on tarkasteltu, jäävät yleensä riittämättömiksi: (1) aikaisempien lähtö- ja saapumisaikojen jäsensuhteiden ja vuoropuhelutietoisten dynaamisten lähtö- ja saapumisaikojen suhteiden yhdistämisessä nimenomaisesti ja (2) yleistämisessä näkymättömiin alueisiin. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta \\textbf{D}dynaaminen \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}työtä (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), joka luo dynaamisen kaavion yhdistämään nimenomaisesti aikaisemmat slot-verkkotunnuksen jäsenyyssuhteet ja dialogitietoiset dynaamiset slot-suhteet. Se käyttää kaavioita myös helpottaakseen tietämyksen siirtoa uusille aloille. DSGFNet koostuu dialogin ilmaisukooderista, schema graph kooderista, dialog-tietoinen schema graph kehittyvästä verkosta ja schema graph tehostetusta dialogin tiladekooderista. Vertailutietoaineistojen empiiriset tulokset (SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 ja MultiWOZ2.2) osoittavat, että DSGFNet on tehokkaampi kuin olemassa olevat menetelmät.', 'sq': 'Dialogu State Tracking (DST) synon të mbajë gjurmën e qëllimeve të përdoruesve gjatë një bisedimi. Në DST, modelimi i marrëdhënieve midis domeneve dhe slotëve është ende një problem i nënstudiuar. Përqasjet ekzistuese që kanë konsideruar marrëdhënie të tilla përgjithësisht janë të shkurtra në: (1) bashkimin e marrëdhënieve të mëparshme të anëtarësimit në fushën slot-domain dhe marrëdhëniet dinamike të slot në dijeni të dialogut shprehësisht dhe (2) gjeneralizimin në fushë të padukshme. Për të trajtuar këto çështje, propozojmë një roman \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), i cili gjeneron një grafik skemash dinamik për të bashkuar eksplicitalisht marrëdhëniet e mëparshme të anëtarësimit në fushën slot-domain dhe marrëdhëniet dinamike të fushës dialogues. Ajo përdor gjithashtu skemat për të lehtësuar transferimin e njohurive në fusha të reja. DSGFNet consists of a dialogue utterance encoder, a schema graph encoder, a dialogue-aware schema graph evolving network, and a schema graph enhanced dialogue state decoder.  Rezultatet empirike në bazat e të dhënave (pra, SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 dhe MultiWOZ2.2) tregojnë se DSGFNet ekziston më shumë se metodat ekzistuese.', 'jv': 'Dialog Stat tracing (SST) goal to track of user\'s moves Nang The presence of conflicts that have been contexted this ratio often falls shortly in: (1) combing before slot-domain membersance ratios and dialog-Awake dynamics slot ratios elusically, and (2) Generalizaing to unseen domain. To Address this sums, we proposal a translation \\textbf {D}dynamics \\textbf {S}km a \\textbf {G}raph \\textbf {F}usion \\textbf {net}job (\\textbf {dsGFnet}), that Generes a dynamics scheme graph to explicitly combe the previous slot-domain membersance ratio and dialog-Awart dynamics slot ratio. Punika andhados akeh nggawe sistem kanggo ngetokake tarjamahan kanggo sabên anyar " bench', 'sk': 'Sledenje stanju dialoga (DST) je namenjeno spremljanju namenov uporabnikov med pogovorom. V DST je modeliranje odnosov med domenami in režami še vedno premalo raziskan problem. Obstoječi pristopi, ki so upoštevali take odnose, na splošno primanjkujejo: (1) eksplicitno združevanje prejšnjih odnosov članstva v slotih in dinamičnih odnosov s sloti, ki se zavedajo dialoga, in (2) posplošitev na nevidna področja. Za reševanje teh vprašanj predlagamo nov \\textbf{D}dinamični \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}delo (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), ki ustvari dinamični shematski graf za eksplicitno združitev prejšnjih članskih relacij z domeno rež in dinamičnih relacij z režami, ki se zavedajo dialogov. Sheme uporablja tudi za lažji prenos znanja na nova področja. DSGFNet je sestavljen iz kodirnika izgovorov v pogovornem oknu, kodirnika sheme grafov, ki se razvija omrežje sheme grafov, ki se zaveda dialoga, in dekodirnika stanja pogovornega okna z izboljšanim grafom sheme. Empirični rezultati referenčnih naborov podatkov (tj. SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 in MultiWOZ2.2) kažejo, da DSGFNet presega obstoječe metode.', 'he': 'מעקב המדינה של דיאלוג (DST) מטרה לשמור על כוונות המשתמשים במהלך שיחה. ב-DST, דוגמנית מערכות היחסים בין שטחים וסקוטים היא עדיין בעיה מתחת למחקר. גישות קיימות ששוקלות מערכות יחסים כאלה בדרך כלל נמצאות קצרות ב: (1) מיזוג מערכות יחסי חברות קודמות של שטח-שטח ולמערכות יחסים דינמיות של שטח מודעות לדיאלוג באופן ברור, ו (2) הגנרליזציה לתחומים בלתי נראים. כדי להתמודד עם הנושאים האלה, אנו מציעים רומן \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), שיוצר גרף סגמה דינמי כדי למחוז באופן ברור את יחסי החברות הקודמים של שטח-שטח-שטח וליחסי השטח דינמיים מודעים לדיאלוג. הוא גם משתמש בשרשים כדי להקל את העברת ידע לתחומים חדשים. DSGFNet מורכבת ממקודד דיאלוג מילים, קודד גרף סגמה, רשת שפותחת גרף סגמה מודעת לדיולוג, ומקודד דיאלוג מיותר לגרף סגמה. Empirical results on benchmark datasets (i.e., SGD, MultiWOZ2.1, and MultiWOZ2.2), show that DSGFNet outperforms existing methods.', 'ha': "Dialogue State Tracking (DST) aims to keep track of users' intentions during the course of a conversation.  In DS, mai motsi da mazaɓan jama'a da slogansa, yana kasa wani matsayi da aka karanta. Tsarin da ke da yanzu waɗanda suka yi bincike da wannan mazauni jumla sun ƙara cikin: (1) mai saurarwa gabanin mazaunin na slot-Domen da mazaunin mutane da ke fahimta da bayani, da (2) mai ƙidida zuwa bakwai waɗanda ba'a sani ba. To, da za mu buɗe masu shiryuwa da wannan masu husũma, za'a buƙata wani node na /littãfin na `asalin `kwamfyutan `maimakon`kwamfyutan `maimakon`kwamfyutan `grammar`kwamfyutan `%s' da ke buɗe wa mazaɓan na dangane na danna na na-bangon bango na farko na slot-Domen. Yana amfani da kwamfyuta don ya sauƙaƙara transfer da ilmi zuwa sauri. DSGFNet na ƙunsa da kode na magana cikin zauren akwatin bayani, wani kode na fuskar kwamfyuta, wata jerin kwamfyutan zauren akwatin bayani da aka sanar da shi, da kuma wata diode na tsarin jeri da aka ƙara zauren akwatin bayani. @ info: status", 'bo': "Dialogue State Tracking (DST) aims to keep track of users' intentions during a conversation. DST ནང་དུ། domeins དང་སྒེར་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མིག་རྣམས་ལས་ཀླད་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡོད། Existing approaches that have considered such relations generally fall short in: (1) fusing prior slot-domain membership relations and dialog-aware dynamic slot relations explicitly, and (2) generalizing to unseen domain. To address these issues, we propose a novel \\textbf{D}ynamic \\textbf{S}chema \\textbf{G}raph \\textbf{F}usion \\textbf{Net}work (\\textbf{DSGFNet}), which generates a dynamic schema graph to explicitly fuse the prior slot-domain membership relations and dialog-aware dynamic slot relations. དེས་དབང་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་གསར་བ་ལ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་པར་ལས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། DSGFNet consists of a dialog utterance encoder, a schema graph encoder, a dialog-aware schema graph evolving network, and a schema graph enhanced dialog state decoder. benchmark datasets (དཔེར་ན SGD, MultiWOZ2.1 དང་། MultiWOZ2.2) གི་འབྱུང་ལས་གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོད་པ་ནི་DSGFNet དེ་གནས་ཡུལ་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཐོག་བྱེད་འདུག"}
{'en': 'De-Bias for Generative Extraction in Unified ', 'ar': 'مسائل درجة حرارة الانتباه في التقطير التلخيصي التلخيصي', 'pt': 'Atenção a temperatura importa na destilação de sumarização abstrativa', 'es': 'Atención: la temperatura importa en la destilación de resumen abstractivo', 'fr': 'Attention\xa0: la température est importante dans la distillation par synthèse abstraite', 'ja': '抽象的な要約蒸留における注意温度の重要性', 'zh': '谨抽象蒸馏中温度', 'ru': 'Внимание, температура имеет значение при абстрактном обобщении дистилляции', 'hi': 'अमूर्त Summarization आसवन में ध्यान तापमान मामलों', 'ga': 'Cúrsaí Airde Teochta i nDriogadh Achoimrithe Teibí', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიგური კომპანიზაციის გარეშე', 'hu': 'Figyelem Hőmérséklet szempontok az absztraktív összefoglaló desztillációban', 'el': 'Η θερμοκρασία προσοχής έχει σημασία στην απόσταξη αφηρημένης συνοψίας', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті тұжырымдамасын өзгерту температурасы', 'it': 'Attenzione Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'mk': 'Внимание за температурата во апстрактивната резултатска дистилација', 'lt': 'Atkreipti dėmesį į temperatūros klausimus abstraktyvios santraukos distiliacijos metu', 'ms': 'Masalah Suhu Perhatian dalam Distillasi Penapisan Abstraktif', 'mt': 'Kwistjonijiet dwar it-Temperatura tal-Attenzjoni fid-Distillazzjoni tas-Sommarju Abstrattiv', 'ml': 'അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കത്തിലെ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч Температурын асуудал', 'no': 'Attention Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'ro': 'Atenţie: Temperatura contează în distilarea abstractivă de sinteză', 'pl': 'Uwaga Temperatura ma znaczenie w destylacji abstrakcyjnej podsumowującej', 'sr': 'Температура внимания у абстрактивној описањи', 'si': 'අවධානය උෂ්මාණයක් අවධානය සම්පූර්ණය විස්තර', 'so': 'Dhaqaalaha Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'sv': 'Uppmärksamhet Temperatur Matters in Abstractive Summarisation Destillation', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிடுதல் சுருக்கமாக்கத்தில் கவனம் செலுத்தும் வெப்பம்', 'ur': 'توجه کی تولیدہ موضوع Abstractive Summarization Distillation میں', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chú ý Vấn đề nhiệt độ trong hỗn hợp phân tách', 'bg': 'Внимание Температурата има значение в дестилацията на абстрактивно обобщаване', 'hr': 'Oprezni materijali temperature u destilaciji abstraktivnog sažetka', 'da': 'Opmærksomhed Temperatur Matters in Abstractive Summarisation Destillation', 'nl': 'Aandacht Temperatuur telt bij abstracte samenvattingsdestillatie', 'de': 'Aufmerksamkeitstemperatur spielt eine Rolle bei der abstrakten Zusammenfassung der Destillation', 'id': 'Perhatian Suhu Masalah dalam Distillasi Penapisan Abstraktif', 'fa': 'موضوع دمای توجه در حفاظت جمع\u200cسازی Abstractive', 'ko': '추상적 요약 중의 주의사항', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Temperature in Distribution Summary of Abstractive', 'tr': 'unit-format', 'af': 'Waarskuwing Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'sq': 'Vëmendje për çështjet e temperaturës në distilimin abstraktiv të përmbledhjes', 'am': 'Attention Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'hy': 'Attention Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'az': 'Attention Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'bn': 'আবট্রাক্টিভ সামারিজেশনে তাপমাত্রা বিষয়ের দৃষ্টি আকর্ষণ করুন', 'bs': 'Oprezni materijali temperature u destilaciji abstraktivne sažetke', 'ca': "Les qüestions de la temperatura de l'atenció en la destilació abstractiva", 'cs': 'Pozornost Teplota je důležitá při abstraktivní shrnutí destilace', 'et': 'Tähelepanu Temperatuur on oluline abstraktse sumariseerimise destillatsioonis', 'fi': 'Huomio Lämpötilan merkitys abstraktiivisessa yhteenvetotislauksessa', 'ha': 'Attention Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation', 'sk': 'Pozor Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Destilation', 'jv': 'Attension Tenperatur mats in absolute Cumarination Distillition', 'he': 'תשומת לב חומרי טמפרטורה במסגרת סדרה אסטרקטיבית', 'bo': 'Attention Temperature Matters in Abstractive Summarization Distillation'}
{'en': 'Named entity recognition (NER) is a fundamental task to recognize specific types of entities from a given sentence. Depending on how the entities appear in the sentence, it can be divided into three subtasks, namely, Flat NER, Nested NER, and Discontinuous NER. Among the existing approaches, only the generative model can be uniformly adapted to these three subtasks. However, when the generative model is applied to NER, its optimization objective is not consistent with the task, which makes the model vulnerable to the incorrect biases. In this paper, we analyze the incorrect biases in the generation process from a causality perspective and attribute them to two confounders: pre-context confounder and entity-order confounder. Furthermore, we design Intra- and Inter-entity Deconfounding Data Augmentation methods to eliminate the above confounders according to the theory of backdoor adjustment. Experiments show that our method can improve the performance of the generative NER model in various datasets.', 'ar': 'يعتمد التقدم الأخير في تلخيص النص التجريدي إلى حد كبير على نماذج المحولات الكبيرة المدربة مسبقًا من التسلسل إلى التسلسل ، والتي تكون باهظة الثمن من الناحية الحسابية. تهدف هذه الورقة إلى تقطير هذه النماذج الكبيرة إلى نماذج أصغر للاستدلال بشكل أسرع وبأقل قدر من فقدان الأداء. الأساليب القائمة على وضع العلامات الزائفة شائعة في تقطير نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل. في هذه الورقة ، وجدنا أن التلاعب في درجات حرارة الانتباه في المحولات يمكن أن يجعل التسميات الزائفة أسهل في التعلم لنماذج الطلاب. تُظهر تجاربنا على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات تلخيصية أن طريقتنا المقترحة تعمل باستمرار على تحسين الأساليب القائمة على وضع العلامات الزائفة للفانيليا. يُظهر التحليل التجريبي الإضافي أن كلاً من الملصقات الزائفة والملخصات التي ينتجها طلابنا أقصر وأكثر تجريدية.', 'es': 'El progreso reciente de la sumarización abstractiva de textos se basa en gran medida en grandes modelos Transformer secuencia a secuencia previamente entrenados, que son computacionalmente costosos. Este documento tiene como objetivo destilar estos modelos grandes en modelos más pequeños para una inferencia más rápida y con una pérdida mínima de rendimiento. Los métodos basados en pseudo-marcaje son populares en la destilación modelo secuencia a secuencia. En este artículo, descubrimos que la simple manipulación de las temperaturas de atención en Transformers puede hacer que las pseudo etiquetas sean más fáciles de aprender para los modelos de estudiantes. Nuestros experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos de resumen muestran que nuestro método propuesto mejora consistentemente los métodos basados en el pseudoetiquetado básico. Un análisis empírico más detallado muestra que tanto las seudoetiquetas como los resúmenes producidos por nuestros estudiantes son más cortos y abstractivos.', 'fr': "Les récents progrès de la synthèse de textes abstraits reposent en grande partie sur de grands modèles de transformateurs séquence-séquence pré-entraînés, qui sont coûteux en termes de calcul. Cet article vise à distiller ces grands modèles en modèles plus petits pour une inférence plus rapide et avec une perte de performance minimale. Les méthodes basées sur le pseudo-marquage sont populaires dans la distillation séquence-à-séquence de modèles. Dans cet article, nous découvrons que le simple fait de manipuler les températures de l'attention dans les transformateurs peut faciliter l'apprentissage des pseudo-étiquettes pour les modèles d'étudiants. Nos expériences sur trois ensembles de données de synthèse montrent que la méthode que nous proposons améliore constamment les méthodes basées sur le pseudo-marquage vanille. D'autres analyses empiriques montrent que les pseudo-étiquettes et les résumés produits par nos étudiants sont plus courts et plus abstraits.", 'pt': 'O progresso recente da sumarização de texto abstrativa depende em grande parte de grandes modelos de transformadores de sequência a sequência pré-treinados, que são computacionalmente caros. Este trabalho visa destilar esses modelos grandes em modelos menores para inferência mais rápida e com perda mínima de desempenho. Métodos baseados em pseudo-marcação são populares na destilação de modelo de sequência a sequência. Neste artigo, descobrimos que simplesmente manipular as temperaturas de atenção em Transformers pode tornar os pseudo rótulos mais fáceis de aprender para os modelos dos alunos. Nossos experimentos em três conjuntos de dados de sumarização mostram que nosso método proposto melhora consistentemente os métodos baseados em pseudo-rotulagem vanilla. Análises empíricas posteriores mostram que tanto os pseudo rótulos quanto os resumos produzidos por nossos alunos são mais curtos e mais abstratos.', 'ja': '抽象的なテキストの要約の最近の進捗は、大規模な事前に訓練されたシーケンスツーシーケンストランスフォーマーモデルに大きく依存しており、これは計算コストが高い。この論文は、これらの大きなモデルをより小さなモデルに蒸留して、より速い推論と最小限のパフォーマンス損失を実現することを目的としています。シーケンスツーシーケンスモデル蒸留では、擬似ラベル付け法が普及している。この論文では、トランスフォーマーの注意温度を操作するだけで、擬似ラベルを学習者モデルにとって学習しやすくなることがわかりました。3つの要約データセットの実験では、提案された方法は一貫してバニラ偽ラベル付けに基づく方法を改善することが示されています。さらなる実証的分析によると、私たちの学生が作成した擬似ラベルと要約の両方が短く、より抽象的であることが示されています。', 'zh': '抽象摘要者最新进展大赖于大转换器,其数贵矣。 本旨将这些大模提炼成较小的模形,以成更快的推理速度和最小的性能损失。 盖伪标之法,序于蒸馏中甚行。 本文之中,略操变形金刚意温度,可使学生模样更易学伪标签。 三总数集上之实验,始终如一。 益实分析表明,吾徒伪标与摘要皆短,更抽象。', 'hi': 'Abstractive पाठ summarization की हाल की प्रगति काफी हद तक बड़े पूर्व प्रशिक्षित अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल पर निर्भर करती है, जो कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से महंगे हैं। इस पेपर का उद्देश्य इन बड़े मॉडलों को तेजी से अनुमान के लिए और न्यूनतम प्रदर्शन हानि के साथ छोटे लोगों में डिस्टिल करना है। छद्म लेबलिंग आधारित विधियां अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल आसवन में लोकप्रिय हैं। इस पेपर में, हम पाते हैं कि ट्रांसफॉर्मर में ध्यान के तापमान में हेरफेर करना छात्र मॉडल के लिए सीखने के लिए छद्म लेबल को आसान बना सकता है। तीन summarization datasets पर हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि लगातार वेनिला छद्म लेबलिंग आधारित तरीकों में सुधार करती है। आगे के अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि हमारे छात्रों द्वारा उत्पादित छद्म लेबल और सारांश दोनों छोटे और अधिक अमूर्त हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавний прогресс абстрактного обобщения текста в значительной степени зависит от больших предварительно обученных моделей последовательности трансформаторов, которые являются вычислительно дорогостоящими. Целью данной работы является разделение этих больших моделей на более мелкие для более быстрого вывода и с минимальными потерями производительности. Методы, основанные на псевдомечении, популярны при перегонке моделей последовательностей. В этой статье мы находим, что простое манипулирование температурой внимания в трансформаторах может облегчить изучение псевдо-метки для студенческих моделей. Наши эксперименты с тремя суммирующими наборами данных показывают, что предлагаемый нами метод последовательно улучшает методы на основе псевдомаркировки ванили. Дальнейший эмпирический анализ показывает, что как псевдо-метки, так и резюме, подготовленные нашими студентами, являются более короткими и более абстрактными.', 'ga': 'Braitheann dul chun cinn le déanaí maidir le hachoimriú téacs teibí go mór ar mhúnlaí móra Trasfhoirmeoirí seicheamh-go-seicheamh réamhoilte, atá costasach ó thaobh ríomha de. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an bpáipéar seo na samhlacha móra seo a dhriogadh ina samhlacha níos lú le haghaidh tátail níos tapúla agus le caillteanas feidhmíochta íosta. Tá an-tóir ar mhodhanna atá bunaithe ar lipéadú bréagach i ndriogadh samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh. Sa pháipéar seo, feicimid gur féidir le hionramháil teochtaí aird i Claochladáin lipéid bhréige a dhéanamh níos éasca le foghlaim do mhúnlaí mac léinn. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar thrí thacar sonraí achoimrithe go bhfeabhsaíonn an modh atá beartaithe againn modhanna atá bunaithe ar lipéadú bréige fanaile go seasta. Léiríonn anailís eimpíreach bhreise go bhfuil an dá lipéid bhréige agus achoimrí arna dtáirgeadh ag ár gcuid mac léinn níos giorra agus níos teibí.', 'el': 'Η πρόσφατη πρόοδος της αφηρημένης σύνοψης κειμένου βασίζεται σε μεγάλο βαθμό σε μεγάλα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία, τα οποία είναι υπολογιστικά ακριβά. Η παρούσα εργασία στοχεύει στην απόσταξη αυτών των μεγάλων μοντέλων σε μικρότερα για ταχύτερη εξαγωγή και με ελάχιστη απώλεια απόδοσης. Οι μέθοδοι που βασίζονται στη σήμανση είναι δημοφιλείς στην απόσταξη προτύπων ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διαπιστώνουμε ότι ο απλός χειρισμός της θερμοκρασίας προσοχής στους μετασχηματιστές μπορεί να κάνει τις ψευδο-ετικέτες ευκολότερες να μάθουν για τα μοντέλα μαθητών. Τα πειράματά μας σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων σύνοψης δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βελτιώνει σταθερά τις μεθόδους ψευδομαρτοποίησης βανίλιας. Περαιτέρω εμπειρική ανάλυση δείχνει ότι τόσο οι ψευδο-ετικέτες όσο και οι περιλήψεις που παράγονται από τους μαθητές μας είναι μικρότερες και πιο αφηρημένες.', 'hu': 'Az absztraktív szövegösszefoglalás közelmúltbeli fejlődése nagymértékben előre képzett transzformátor modelleken alapul, amelyek számítástechnikailag drágák. Ez a tanulmány célja, hogy ezeket a nagyméretű modelleket kisebb modellekre desztilláljuk a gyorsabb következtetés és minimális teljesítményvesztés érdekében. A pszeudo-címkézésen alapuló módszerek népszerűek a szekvencia-szekvencia modell desztillációban. Ebben a tanulmányban azt találjuk, hogy a Transformers figyelemhőmérsékletének egyszerű manipulálása megkönnyíti a pszeudo címkék tanulását a diákmodellek számára. Három összefoglaló adatkészleten végzett kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy javasolt módszerünk következetesen javítja a vanília pszeudo-címkézési módszereket. További empirikus elemzés azt mutatja, hogy mind a pszeudo címkék, mind a hallgatók által készített összefoglalók rövidebbek és absztraktabbak.', 'ka': 'бғҗбғ‘бғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғҘбғўбғҳбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғўбғ”бғҘбғЎбғўбғҳбғЎ бғҷбғқбғӣбғЈбғңбғҳбғ–бғҗбғӘбғҳбғҳбғЎ бғҗбғ‘бғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғҘбғўбғҳбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғһбғ\xa0бғқбғ’бғ\xa0бғ”бғЎбғҳ бғ«бғҗбғҡбғҳбғҗбғң бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғ“бғҳбғ“бғҳ бғһбғ\xa0бғқбғ’бғ\xa0бғ”бғЎбғҳ бғ’бғҗбғңбғЎбғ¬бғҗбғ•бғҡбғҗ бғЁбғ”бғӣбғ“бғ”бғ’ бғ\xa0бғ”бғңбғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғҘбғўбғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғ”бғ\xa0бғҳбғЎ бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғ–бғ”, бғ\xa0бғқбғӣбғ”бғҡбғҳбғӘ бғҷбғқбғӣбғһбғЈбғўбғҳбғ\xa0бғ” бғ”бғЎ бғ“бғқбғҷбғЈбғӣбғ”бғңбғўбғҳ бғӣбғҳбғ–бғ”бғ–бғҳбғҗбғң, бғ\xa0бғқбғӣ бғҗбғӣ бғ“бғҳбғ“бғҳ бғӣбғқбғ“бғ”бғҡбғ”бғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғ\xa0бғ”бғЁбғ” бғӘбғ®бғқбғ•бғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғ\xa0бғ”бғЁбғ” бғ“бғҗ бғӣбғҳбғңбғҳбғӣбғҗбғҡбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғӘбғ“бғҳбғҡбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғ\xa0бғ”бғЁбғ”. Pseudo- бғӣбғҗбғ\xa0бғ—бғҡбғ—бғҗбғң бғ“бғҗбғ‘бғҗбғ–бғ”бғЈбғҡбғҳ бғӣбғ”бғўбғқбғ•бғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғһбғқбғҡбғҳбғһбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳбғҗ бғЎбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳбғҷбғ”бғңбғ”бғЎбғҳ бғҗбғӣ бғ“бғқбғҷбғЈбғңбғ”бғЁбғҳ, бғ©бғ•бғ”бғң бғ«бғҗбғҡбғҳбғҗбғң бғӣбғҗбғңбғЎбғһбғЈбғҡбғҗбғӘбғҳбғҗбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғңбғҗбғ®бғҡбғқбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғўбғ”бғӣбғһбғ”бғ\xa0бғҗбғӘбғҳбғҗбғЎ бғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғңбғӨбғқбғ\xa0бғӣбғ”бғўбғ\xa0бғ”бғ‘бғЁбғҳ бғЁбғ”бғ’бғ•бғҳбғ«бғҡбғҳбғҗ бғ’бғҗбғ•бғҗбғҷбғ”бғ—бғқбғ— бғһбғ”бғЎбғ”бғ“бғқ бғҡбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғҡбғ”бғўбғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғҗбғ“бғ•бғҳбғҡбғ”бғ“ бғ©бғ•бғ”бғңбғҳ бғ”бғҘбғЎбғһбғ”бғ\xa0бғҳбғӣбғ”бғңбғўбғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғЎбғҗбғӣбғҳ бғЎбғҳбғӣбғ‘бғқбғҡбғқбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғӣбғқбғңбғҗбғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғЁбғ”бғЎбғҗбғ®бғ”бғ‘ бғ©бғ•бғ”бғңбғҳ бғһбғ\xa0бғқбғ’бғ\xa0бғҗбғӣбғҳбғЎ бғЁбғ”бғЎбғҗбғ«бғҡбғ”бғ‘бғ”бғҡбғҗбғ“ бғ’бғҗбғңбғҳбғҡбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳ бғһбғ”бғЎбғ”бғЈбғ“бғқ бғӣбғҗбғ\xa0бғӘбғ”бғӣбғ”бғңбғўбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғЁбғ”бғЎбғҗбғ®бғ”бғ‘. бғ©бғ•бғ”бғңбғҳ бғЎбғўбғЈбғ“бғ”бғңбғўбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғЎ бғ’бғҗбғӣбғқбғ§бғ”бғңбғ”бғ‘бғЈбғҡбғҳ бғһбғ”бғЎбғ”бғ“бғқ бғҡбғ”бғ‘бғҳбғҡбғ”бғўбғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғ“бғҗ бғЎбғҗбғ–бғқбғ’бғҗбғ“бғқбғ”бғ‘бғ”бғ‘бғҳ бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғҷбғҳбғ“бғ”бғ• бғ“бғҗ бғЈбғӨбғ\xa0бғқ бғҗбғ‘бғЎбғўбғ\xa0бғҗбғҘбғўбғҳбғЈбғ\xa0бғҳбғҗ.', 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikta abstraktinės teksto santraukos pažanga daugiausia grindžiama dideliais iš anksto parengtais iš eilės į eilę Transformuotojų modeliais, kurie yra skaičiavimo požiūriu brangūs. Šiuo dokumentu siekiama distiliuoti šiuos didelius modelius į mažesnius, kad būtų galima greičiau daryti išvadą ir mažiausiai prarasti rezultatus. Pseudo ženklinimo metodai yra populiarūs distiliuojant iš eilės į eilę model į. Šiame dokumente matome, kad paprasčiausiai manipuliuojant dėmesio temperatūromis transformatoriuose pseudo etiketės gali būti lengviau mokytis student ų modeliams. Mūsų eksperimentai su trimis santraukų duomenų rinkiniais rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas metodas nuolat tobulina vanilės pseudo ženklinimo metodus. Tolesnė empirinė analizė rodo, kad mūsų studentų parengtos pseudo etiketės ir santraukos yra trumpesnės ir abstraktesnės.', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті мәтін тұжырымдамасының жаңа жағдайда көбінде бұл компьютерлік үлкен алдын- келесі тұратын түрлендіру үлгілеріне тұрады. Бұл қағаз бұл үлкен үлгілерді тез жеткізу үшін жұмыс істеу үшін жұмыс істеу үшін жұмыс істеу үшін кіші үлгілерді таңдау керек. Псеудо жарлығына негізделген әдістер реттегі реттегі үлгілерді дистилляциялау үшін жалғастырылады. Бұл қағазда, оқушылар үлгілерінде псевдо жарлықтарын оқу үшін оңай алады. Үш жазылған деректер қорларының тәжірибелеріміз қолданылған тәжірибелеріміз vanilla псевдо- жазылған тәжірибелерін жасайды. Қосымша импирикалық анализ студенттеріміздің псевдо жарлықтары мен тұжырымдары қысқартық және абстрактивтік.', 'it': "I recenti progressi della sintesi astratta del testo si basano in gran parte su grandi modelli di Transformer sequenza-sequenza pre-addestrati, che sono computazionalmente costosi. Questo articolo mira a distillare questi modelli di grandi dimensioni in quelli più piccoli per inferenza più rapida e con perdita minima di prestazioni. I metodi basati sulla pseudoetichettatura sono popolari nella distillazione del modello sequenza-sequenza. In questo articolo, troviamo che semplicemente manipolare le temperature di attenzione in Transformers può rendere le pseudo etichette più facili da imparare per i modelli degli studenti. I nostri esperimenti su tre set di dati di sintesi mostrano che il nostro metodo proposto migliora costantemente i metodi basati sulla pseudo-etichettatura alla vaniglia. Un'ulteriore analisi empirica mostra che sia le pseudo etichette che i riassunti prodotti dai nostri studenti sono più brevi e più astratti.", 'mk': 'Неодамнешниот напредок на апстрактивната резултатација на текстот во голема мера зависи од големи предобучени трансформски модели од секвенца до секвенца, кои се компјутационално скапи. This paper aims to distill these large models into smaller ones for faster inference and with minimal performance loss.  Методите базирани на псеводозначување се популарни во дистилација на моделот од секвенца до секвенца. In this paper, we find simply manipulating attention temperatures in Transformers can make pseudo labels easier to learn for student models.  Нашите експерименти на три компјутери на податоци покажуваат дека нашиот предложен метод константно ги подобрува методите базирани на ванила псевдо-означување. Понатамошна емпирична анализа покажува дека и псевдо-етикетите, и резултатите произведени од нашите студенти се пократки и поапстрактивни.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രോഗത്തിലുള്ള പദാവലി സംസാരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രാധാനപ്പെട്ട മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്ക This paper aims to distill these large models into smaller ones for faster inference and with minimal performance loss.  സെയുഡോ-ലേബിളിങ്ങ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രധാനമാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാരിലെ ശ്രദ്ധ തേപ്പര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളു മൂന്നു വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d മാറ്റം വരുത്തുന്ന വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിശ്വാസം കുറഞ്ഞതും കൂടുതല്\u200d അസാധ്യതയുള്ളതുമാണ്.', 'ms': 'Kemajuan baru-baru ini penghuraian teks abstraktif bergantung pada model Transformer rangkaian-ke-rangkaian besar, yang mahal secara kiraan. Kertas ini bermaksud untuk membersihkan model besar ini ke model yang lebih kecil untuk kesimpulan yang lebih cepat dan dengan kehilangan prestasi minimal. Kaedah berdasarkan penanda-pseudo adalah populer dalam susunan-ke-susunan model. Dalam kertas ini, kita hanya mencari manipulasi suhu perhatian dalam Transformers boleh membuat label pseudo lebih mudah untuk belajar untuk model pelajar. Eksperimen kami pada tiga set data ringkasan menunjukkan kaedah kami diusulkan secara konsisten meningkatkan kaedah berdasarkan pseudo-label vanilla. Analisis empirik lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahawa kedua-dua label pseudo dan ringkasan yang dihasilkan oleh pelajar kita lebih pendek dan lebih abstraktif.', 'mt': 'Recent progress of abstractive text summarization largely relies on large pre-trained sequence-to-sequence Transformer models, which are computationally expensive.  Dan id-dokument għandu l-għan li jiddistilla dawn il-mudelli l-kbar f’mudelli iżgħar għal inferenza aktar mgħaġġla u b’telf minimu ta’ prestazzjoni. Metodi bbażati fuq it-tikkettar psewdo huma popolari fid-distillazzjoni tal-mudell minn sekwenza għal sekwenza. F’dan id-dokument jinstabu sempliċement li t-temperaturi ta’ attenzjoni f’Transformers jiġu manipulati jistgħu jagħmlu t-tikketti psewdo aktar faċli biex jitgħallmu għall-mudelli tal-istudenti. L-esperimenti tagħna fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju juru li l-metodu propost tagħna jtejjeb b’mod konsistenti l-metodi bbażati fuq psewdotikkettar tal-vanilla. Analiżi empirika ulterjuri turi li kemm it-tikketti psewdo kif ukoll is-sommarji prodotti mill-istudenti tagħna huma iqsar u aktar astratti.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie postępy abstrakcyjnego podsumowania tekstu w dużej mierze opierają się na dużych wstępnie przeszkolonych modelach transformatorów sekwencji do sekwencji, które są kosztowne obliczeniowo. Celem niniejszego artykułu jest destylacja tych dużych modeli na mniejsze w celu szybszego wnioskowania i minimalnej utraty wydajności. Metody oparte na etykietowaniu pseudo są popularne w destylacji modelu sekwencji do sekwencji. W niniejszym artykule zauważamy, że po prostu manipulowanie temperaturą uwagi w Transformatorach może ułatwić naukę pseudo etykiet dla modeli studenckich. Nasze eksperymenty na trzech zestawach danych podsumowujących pokazują, że proponowana metoda konsekwentnie ulepsza metody oparte na pseudoznakowaniu wanilii. Dalsza analiza empiryczna pokazuje, że zarówno pseudo etykiety, jak i streszczenia wytwarzane przez naszych uczniów są krótsze i bardziej abstrakcyjne.', 'no': 'Nyleg framgang av abstraktiv tekstsammendering er stort på stor først trengte sekvens- til- sekvens- transformeringsmodeller, som er datamaskin kostar. Denne papiret måtar å distillere desse store modelane til mindre for raskare infeksjon og med minste tap av utviklinga. Pseudo- etiketteringsbaserte metodar er populære i sekvens- til- sekvensmodelledistillasjon. I denne papiret finn vi enkelt å manipulere oppmerkstemperaturar i Transformerande for å gjera pseudoetikettar lettere å lære for studentmodeller. Eksperimentane våre på tre sammendragsdata viser vårt foreslått metode konsekvent forbedrar vanylige pseudomerkelingsbaserte metodar. Dei fleire empiriske analysene viser at både pseudoetikettar og samandrag av studentene våre er kortere og meir abstraktive.', 'mn': 'Саяхан abstractive text summarization-ын хөгжлийн хөгжлийг ихэнхдээ тооцоололтой үнэтэй тооцоололтоор дасгал хөгжлийн дарааллаар дамжуулагч загвар дээр хамаарна. Энэ цаасан эдгээр том загваруудыг хурдан халдварлах болон бага үйл ажиллагааны алдагдахын тулд жижиг загварууд болгох зорилго юм. Pseudo-labeling суурилсан арга нь дарааллаас дарааллаар загварын ялгааг илэрхийлдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид зүгээр л анхаарлын температурыг Трансформацууд дээр сурагчдын загварын тулд суралцах нь псевдоо загваруудыг илүү амархан болгож чадна. Гурван жинхэнэ өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд манай санал өгсөн арга нь vanilla pseudo-labeling суурь арга замыг сайжруулдаг. Дараагийн эзэмшил шинжилгээ нь оюутнуудын аль нэг нь богино, илүү эзэмшигтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Progresul recent al sintezeizării textelor abstractive se bazează în mare măsură pe modele mari pre-instruite de Transformer secvență-secvență, care sunt costisitoare din punct de vedere computațional. Această lucrare își propune să distileze aceste modele mari în modele mai mici pentru o inferență mai rapidă și cu pierderi minime de performanță. Metodele bazate pe etichetare pseudoetichetă sunt populare în distilarea modelului secvență-la-secvență. În această lucrare, găsim că simpla manipulare a temperaturilor atenției în Transformers poate face pseudo etichetele mai ușor de învățat pentru modelele elevilor. Experimentele noastre pe trei seturi de date de sinteză arată că metoda noastră propusă îmbunătățește în mod constant metodele bazate pe pseudoetichetarea vaniliei. Analiza empirică suplimentară arată că atât pseudo etichetele, cât și rezumatele produse de studenții noștri sunt mai scurte și mai abstractive.', 'sr': 'Nedavni napredak sumiranja abstraktivnog teksta u velikoj mjeri oslanja na velike predobučene modele transformera do sekvence, koji su kompjuterski skupi. Ovaj papir je cilj da destilira ove velike modele u manje za brže infekcije i sa minimalnim gubitkom izvedbe. Metade osnovane na etiketi psiho su popularne u destilaciji modela sekvence do sekvence. U ovom papiru, jednostavno manipulišemo temperaturu pažnje u transformatorima može olakšati pseudo etikete da naučimo za studentske modele. Naši eksperimenti na tri sažeta podataka pokazuju da naša predložena metoda konsekventno poboljšava metode bazirane na vanilnoj pseudo-etiketi. Daljnja empirička analiza pokazuje da su i pseudo etikete i sažetke proizvedene od naših studenata kraći i apstraktivniji.', 'si': 'අවස්ථාවක් පාළුව සංශ්\u200dයාපනය ගොඩක් විශාල විශාල ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලොකු ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා ප්\u200dරධ මේ පත්තරේ අදහස් කරනවා මේ ලොකු මොඩේල් එක්ක පොඩි ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් වෙනුවෙන් වේගයෙන් වැඩි වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේ Pseudo- ලේබලින් අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාවය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද්\u200dයාපනය විද්\u200dයාපනය කරනවා. මේ පත්තරේ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාර්ථකයෙන් අවධාන උත්මාණය සැලසුම් කරන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාර්ථකයෙන්  අපේ පරීක්ෂණ තුනක් සුරකුණු දත්ත සූදානයට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට වැනිලා ස්වීඩෝ ලේබිල් විදිහට අපේ විද්\u200dයාර්ථියෝ නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ විද්යාර්ථියෝ නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'so': "Dhacdooyinka la soo dhowaaday ee la soo saari karo qoraalka, waxey ku xiran tahay tusaale ahaan aad u qaali ah. Qoraalkan waxaa loola jeedaa in tusaalahan waaweyn uu u kala soocaa kuwa yaryar, in ay jiraan waqti dhaqso ah iyo khasaarada sameynta ugu yaraan. Isticmaalka qoyska ee Pseudo-labelinta waa mid ku caadi ah qaababka isbedelka. Warqadan waxaan ka heli karaa in aad ka barto tusaale ardayda oo aad u fududaato barashada jimicsiga. Imtixaankayada oo ku qoran saddexda macluumaad ee summarinta ah waxay muujiyaan qaabkeeneena la soo jeeday, si joogto ah ayuu u beddelaa qaababka lagu qorayo baabba'a. Analyska faahfaarka dheeraadka ah waxaa tusaya in labo iyo xigaan ay ardaydeenu soo saaraan ay gaaban yihiin oo ay ka shaqeeyaan.", 'sv': 'Den senaste utvecklingen av abstraktiv textsammanfattning beror till stor del pﾃ･ stora fﾃｶrintrﾃ､nade sekvens-till-sekvens Transformer modeller, som ﾃ､r berﾃ､kningsmﾃ､ssigt dyra. Denna uppsats syftar till att destillera dessa stora modeller till mindre fﾃｶr snabbare inferens och med minimal prestandafﾃｶrlust. Pseudomﾃ､rkningsbaserade metoder ﾃ､r populﾃ､ra vid sekvens-till-sekvensmodell destillation. I denna uppsats finner vi att helt enkelt manipulering av uppmﾃ､rksamhetstemperaturer i Transformers kan gﾃｶra pseudoetiketter lﾃ､ttare att lﾃ､ra sig fﾃｶr studentmodeller. Vﾃ･ra experiment pﾃ･ tre sammanfattningsdatauppsﾃ､ttningar visar att vﾃ･r fﾃｶreslagna metod konsekvent fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttrar vaniljpseudomﾃ､rkningsbaserade metoder. Vidare empirisk analys visar att bﾃ･de pseudoetiketter och sammanfattningar som produceras av vﾃ･ra studenter ﾃ､r kortare och mer abstrakta.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய செயல்படாத உரை சுருக்கத்தின் செயல்பாடு பெரும்பாலானது பயிற்சி முன் வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர்ச்சி மாற்றும் மாதிரிகளை நம்புகி இந்த தாள் இந்த பெரிய மாதிரிகளை சிறிய மாதிரிகளாக பிரித்து விரைவான துன்பத்திற்கும் குறைந்தபட்ச ச செயல்ப Pseudo- அடிப்படையான முறைமைகள் வரிசையில் இருந்து வரிசை மாதிரி பிரிவில் பெரியது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், மாணவர்களின் மாதிரி மாதிரிகளுக்கு கற்றுக் கொள்ள சுலபமான கவனம் வெப்பநிலையை கையாளும் என்று நாம் கண்ட மூன்று சுருக்கும் தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் சோதனைகள் நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையைக் காண்பிக்கிறது முறையிலும் வ மேலும் ஊக்கத்திற்கு ஆராய்ச்சி காட்டுகிறது என்றால் நம் மாணவர்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சிறிய மற்றும் சுருக்கம் குறைந்த', 'ur': 'اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگلوں سے اگ یہ کاغذ کا ارادہ ہے کہ ان بڑے موڈلوں کو چھوٹے لوگوں میں تقسیم کرنا چاہتا ہے جو بہت سریع آلودگی کے لئے اور کم عملکرد خسارہ کے ساتھ۔ Pseudo-labeling based methods are popular in sequence-to-sequence model distillation. اس کاغذ میں، ہم صرف تغییر دینے والوں میں توجه کے دماغ کی تغییر دینے کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے بہت آسان بنا سکتے ہیں. ہماری تجربیات تین جمع ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ہمیشہ vanilla pseudo-labeling بنیادی طریقے سے بہتر ہوتی ہے. اور اضافہ تحقیقات دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے دانش آموزوں کے ذریعے پیدا ہوئے پیسئڈو لیبل اور سارے سارے چھوٹے اور زیادہ اضافہ ہیں.', 'uz': "Recent progress of abstractive text summarization largely relies on large pre-trained sequence-to-sequence Transformer models, which are computationally expensive.  Bu qogʻoz bu katta modellarni kichkina cheksiz kasallik va kichkina ishlab chiqarish uchun ajratishga ega bo'ladi. Name Bu qogʻozda, biz Transformerlaridagi paytlarning qismlarini boshqarish oddiy narsalarini o'rganish mumkin. Bizning uchta qisqartmalar maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi taʼminlovchimizni taʼminlovchi usulni davom etish usulini ko'rsatadi. Ko'pchilik analytiki ko'rsatadi, bizning o'quvchilarimiz tomonidan yaratilgan tugmalar qisqacha va ko'proq raqamli.", 'vi': 'Những tiến trình gần đây của việc tổng kết văn bản trừu tượng được cấu tạo dựa trên các mô hình biến áp (trình nguyên) lớn. Mục đích của loại giấy này là chưng cất các mô hình lớn này thành các mô hình nhỏ hơn để có được kết quả nhanh hơn và giảm tối thiểu. Cách chế độ phân tách thần kinh rất phổ biến trong việc chưng cất chuỗi-tới-chuỗi. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta tìm thấy việc điều khiển nhiệt độ tập trung trong Transformers có thể làm các nhãn giả dễ học cho các mô hình sinh. Những thí nghiệm trên ba bộ dữ liệu tổng hợp cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị của chúng ta cải tiến phương pháp mô phỏng giả vani. Các nghiên cứu khác có kinh nghiệm cho thấy cả nhãn giả và các bản tóm tắt do học sinh sản xuất đều ngắn hơn và thu nhỏ hơn.', 'bg': 'Напоследък напредъкът на абстрактното обобщаване на текста до голяма степен разчита на големи предварително обучени трансформаторни модели последователност към последователност, които са изчислително скъпи. Настоящата статия има за цел да дестилира тези големи модели в по-малки модели за по-бързо извеждане и с минимална загуба на производителност. Методите, базирани на псевдо маркиране, са популярни при дестилация модел последователност към последователност. В тази статия откриваме, че просто манипулирането на температурите на вниманието в трансформаторите може да направи псевдо етикетите по-лесни за научаване за студентските модели. Нашите експерименти с три набора от данни за обобщаване показват, че предложеният ни метод постоянно подобрява методите на базата на ванилово псевдо етикетиране. Допълнителният емпиричен анализ показва, че както псевдо етикетите, така и резюметата, произведени от нашите ученици, са по-кратки и по-абстрактни.', 'nl': 'Recente vooruitgang van abstracte tekst samenvatting berust grotendeels op grote vooraf getrainde sequentie-to-sequence Transformer modellen, die rekenkundig duur zijn. Dit artikel is bedoeld om deze grote modellen te distilleren in kleinere modellen voor snellere inferentie en met minimaal prestatieverlies. Pseudo-labeling gebaseerde methoden zijn populair bij sequentie-to-sequentie modeldestilletie. In dit artikel vinden we dat het manipuleren van aandachtstemperaturen in Transformers pseudo-labels gemakkelijker kan maken voor studentenmodellen. Onze experimenten met drie samenvattingsdatasets tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde methode consequent vanille pseudo-labeling gebaseerde methoden verbetert. Verdere empirische analyse toont aan dat zowel pseudo labels als samenvattingen van onze studenten korter en abstracter zijn.', 'da': 'De seneste fremskridt med abstraktiv tekst opsummering afhænger i høj grad af store præ-trænede sekvens-til-sekvens Transformer modeller, som er beregningsmæssigt dyre. Denne artikel har til formål at destillere disse store modeller til mindre modeller for hurtigere inference og med minimalt tab af ydeevne. Pseudo-mærkning baserede metoder er populære i sekvens-til-sekvens model destillation. I denne artikel finder vi, at simpelthen manipulering af opmærksomhedstemperaturer i Transformers kan gøre pseudo etiketter lettere at lære for elevmodeller. Vores eksperimenter med tre sammenfattende datasæt viser, at vores foreslåede metode konsekvent forbedrer vanilje pseudo-mærkning baserede metoder. Yderligere empirisk analyse viser, at både pseudo etiketter og resuméer produceret af vores studerende er kortere og mere abstrakte.', 'hr': 'Nedavni napredak sažetka abstraktivnog teksta u velikoj mjeri oslanja na velike predobučene modele transformera do sekvence, koji su računalno skupi. Ovaj papir je cilj destilacije tih velikih modela u manje za brže infekcije i minimalne gubitke učinkovitosti. Metade osnovane na označavanju Pseudo su popularne u destilaciji modela sekvence do sekvence. U ovom papiru, jednostavno manipuliramo temperaturu pažnje u transformatorima može lakše učiti pseudo etikete za studentske modele. Naši eksperimenti na tri skupljanja podataka pokazuju da naš predloženi metod konsekventno poboljšava metode bazirane na vanilnoj pseudo etiketi. Daljnja empirička analiza pokazuje da su i pseudo etikete i sažetke proizvedene od naših učenika kraći i apstraktivniji.', 'de': 'Die jüngsten Fortschritte der abstraktiven Textzusammenfassung basieren weitgehend auf großen vortrainierten Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Transformer Modellen, die rechenteuer sind. Dieses Papier zielt darauf ab, diese großen Modelle in kleinere zu destillieren, um schnellere Inferenzen und mit minimalem Leistungsverlust zu erzielen. Pseudo-Labeling basierte Methoden sind in der Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Modelldestillation beliebt. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir fest, dass die einfache Manipulation von Aufmerksamkeitstemperaturen in Transformern Pseudo-Labels für Schülermodelle leichter erlernbar machen kann. Unsere Experimente an drei Zusammenfassungsdatensätzen zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagene Methode konsequent Vanille-Pseudo-Labeling-basierte Methoden verbessert. Weitere empirische Analysen zeigen, dass sowohl Pseudo-Labels als auch Zusammenfassungen unserer Studierenden kürzer und abstrakter sind.', 'id': 'Recent progress of abstractive text summarization largely relies on large pre-trained sequence-to-sequence Transformer models, which are computationally expensive.  Kertas ini bermaksud untuk mendestilkan model besar ini menjadi model kecil untuk kesimpulan yang lebih cepat dan dengan kehilangan prestasi minimal. Metode berdasarkan psikiater populer dalam distillasi model urutan ke urutan. Dalam kertas ini, kita menemukan hanya memanipulasi suhu perhatian di Transformers dapat membuat label pseudo lebih mudah untuk belajar untuk model siswa. Eksperimen kami pada tiga dataset ringkasan menunjukkan metode kami yang diusulkan secara konsisten meningkatkan metode berdasarkan pseudo-label vanilla. Analisi empirik lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa kedua label pseudo dan ringkasan yang diproduksi oleh siswa kita lebih pendek dan lebih abstrak.', 'ko': '요약 텍스트 요약의 최신 진전은 대량의 미리 훈련된 서열-서열 변환기 모델에 의존하는데 이런 모델의 계산 대가가 매우 높다.본고는 이러한 대형 모델을 비교적 작은 모델로 추출하여 추리를 더욱 빨리 하고 성능 손실을 최소화하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.위조 표기를 바탕으로 하는 방법은 서열에서 서열 모델 증류까지 매우 유행한다.본고에서 우리는 간단하게 변압기 중의 주의 온도를 조종하면 학생 모형이 위조 라벨을 배우기 쉽다는 것을 발견했다.우리가 세 가지 요약 데이터 집합에서의 실험을 통해 우리가 제시한 방법은 위조 표기를 바탕으로 하는 방법을 지속적으로 개선시켰다는 것을 알 수 있다.진일보한 실증 분석에 의하면 우리 학생들이 만든 위조 라벨과 요약은 모두 더욱 짧고 추상적이다.', 'sw': 'Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni ya muhtasari wa maandishi yasiyo na maandishi yanategemea kwa kiasi kikubwa katika mifano makubwa ya mafunzo ya kabla ya kufundishwa kwa mfululizo wa mfululizo, ambayo ni ghali kwa hisabu. Gazeti hili linalenga kutenganisha mifano makubwa katika vifaa vya ndogo kwa ajili ya ugonjwa wa haraka na kupoteza kwa ufanisi mdogo. mbinu zinazoelezea mifumo ya Pseudo ni maarufu katika utofauti wa mifano kwa mfululizo. Katika karatasi hii, tunagundua kudhibiti joto la uchunguzi katika Transformers unaweza kufanya maabara rahisi zaidi ya kujifunza kwa mifano ya wanafunzi. Majaribio yetu kwenye takwimu tatu za muhtasari zinaonyesha mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa kuboresha njia za kutumia maambukizi yasiyoeleweka. Uchambuzi zaidi wa hali ya msisimu unaonyesha kwamba labda za pseudo na muhtasari zilizotengenezwa na wanafunzi wetu ni fupi na zaidi ya kutoa kazi.', 'af': 'Onlangse vordering van abstraktiewe teks opsomming het groot belangrik op groot voorafgeleerde volgorde- na- volgorde Transformer modele, wat is rekenasielik koste. Hierdie papier doel doen om hierdie groot modele in kleinere te distiliseer vir vinniger inferensie en met minimale prestasie verlies. Pseudo- etiketting gebaseerde metodes is populaar in sekwensie- na- sekwensie model destilasie. In hierdie papier vind ons eenvoudig manipuleer aandag temperatuers in Transformers kan pseudo etikette makliker maak om te leer vir studentmodel. Ons eksperimente op drie opsommingsdatastel vertoon ons voorgestelde metode konsistentlik verbeter vanilla pseudo- etiketting gebaseerde metodes. Verdere empiriese analisie vertoon dat beide pseudoetikette en opsommings wat deur ons studente produseer is kort en meer abstraktief.', 'tr': 'Ýakyndaky abstraktiw metin hulaýatynyň öňki görkezilişi uly öňe-öňe-täsirli terjime modellere üýtgedýär. Bu rakam üçin wagtlyk. Bu kagyz bu uly nusgalary çalt hasaplanjak üçin kiçi nusgalary we iň kiçi netijesi ýitirmek üçin üýtgetmek üçin hedef edýär. Pseudo-etiket tabanly yöntemler sequence-to-sequence nusgalarda popüler. Bu kagyzda düşünýän ýöne üns taýýarlamak üçin okuwçylar üçin pseudo etiketleri öwrenmek aňsatlyk biler. Biziň üç ýygnamsal veri setirlerinde deneylerimiz teklip eden yöntemimizi, vanilla pseudo-etiketleme tabanly yöntemlerimizi geliştirir. Daha köp empirik analyzasy okuwçylarymyzdan eden pseudo etiketleriň hem hasaplamalaryň kiçiräk we köp hasaplamadygyny görkezýär.', 'fa': 'پیشرفت اخیرا از جمع کردن متن abstractive بسیار زیادی بر مدل\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی پیش آموزش\u200cشده\u200cای بسیار گرون است. این کاغذ هدف دارد این مدل های بزرگ را به اندازه های کوچکتر جدا کند تا سریع آلودگی سریع تر و با تلف عملکرد minimal. روش\u200cهای پایه\u200cای از نوشته\u200cهای روانشناسی در مدل\u200cهای جدایی به رده\u200cها مشهور هستند. در این کاغذ، ما به ساده\u200cای از تغییر دمای توجه در تغییر\u200cدهندگان می\u200cتوانیم برچسب\u200cهای pseudo را برای مدل دانش آموزان آسانتر ساخت. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری نشان می\u200cدهند که روش پیشنهاد ما همیشه روش\u200cهای پایه\u200cی برچسب\u200cهای pseudo-labeling vanilla را بهتر می\u200cکند. تحلیل امپراتیک بیشتری نشان می دهد که هر دو نقاشی pseudo و جمع\u200cآوری که توسط دانش آموزان ما تولید می\u200cکنند کوتاه\u200cتر و بی\u200cاثر هستند.', 'sq': 'Përparimi i fundit i përmbledhjes abstrakte të tekstit mbështetet kryesisht në modele të mëdha të paratrajnuara nga sekuenca në sekuencë Transformer, të cilat janë të shtrenjta në llogari. Kjo letër synon të distilojë këto modele të mëdha në më të vogla për përfundim më të shpejtë dhe me humbje minimale të performancës. Metodat bazuar në etiketën pseudo janë popullore në distillacionin e modelit sekuencë-në-sekuencë. Në këtë letër, gjejmë thjesht manipulimin e temperaturave të vëmendjes në Transformuesit mund të bëjë etiketat pseudo më të lehta për të mësuar për modelet student ë. Eksperimentet tona në tre grupe të dhënash të përmbledhjes tregojnë se metoda jonë e propozuar përmirëson vazhdimisht metodat bazuar në pseudo-etiketën e vanilës. Analiza e mëtejshme empirike tregon se si etiketat pseudo dhe përmbledhjet e prodhuara nga studentët tanë janë më të shkurtra dhe më abstrakte.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ማቀናቀል በብዛት በተወሰነ በፊት ተማርኮ በክፍለ ደረጃ-ወደ-sequence Transformer models ላይ ይታመናል፡፡ ይህ ገጽ ታላላቆቹን ምሳሌዎች ለፈጥኖ ውጤት እና በጣም ትንሽ ሽፋን ለማድረግ ነው፡፡ Pseudo-labeling based methods are popular in sequence-to-sequence model distillation.  በዚህ ካላት፣ በተማሪው ምሳሌዎች ማስተማርን የሚችል ትኩረት ማድረጊያውን ማግኘት ቀላል ማድረግ እናገኛለን፡፡ በሦስት ማጠቃለያ ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተናዎቻችን የተፈቀደውን የውጤት የፖዲዮ ተሳታፊ ሥርዓት ማድረግ ያሳየናል፡፡ በተጨማሪም ትምህርት የሚያሳየው ተማሪዎቻችን የሚወለዱት ጽሑፎች እና ቁጥር አነስተኛ እና የተለየፉ ናቸው፡፡', 'hy': 'Աբստրակտիվ տեքստի համառոտագրման վերջին զարգացումը հիմնականում հիմնված է մեծ նախապատրաստված հաջորդականության հաջորդականությամբ հաջորդականությամբ հաջորդականությամբ տրանսֆերմերների մոդելների վրա, որոնք հաշ Այս թղթին նպատակն է տարածել այս մեծ մոդելները ավելի փոքր մոդելներով ավելի արագ եզրակացության և մինիմալ արդյունավետության կորստի համար: Հոգեբանական նշաններով հիմնված մեթոդները հայտնի են հաջորդականության դեպի հաջորդականություն մոդելի դիսլիլացիայի մեջ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք պարզապես հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ուշադրության մթնոլորտությունը փոխակերպողների մեջ կարող է ավելի հեշտ սովորել կեղծ պիտակներ ուսանողների մոդելների համար: Մեր փորձարկումները երեք համառոտագրման տվյալների համակարգերի վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մեթոդը մշտապես բարելավում է վանիլիայի կեղծ պիտակում հիմնված մեթոդները: Ավելի էմպրիկական վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր ուսանողների կողմից ստեղծված կեղծ պիտակները և համառոտագրությունները ավելի կարճ և վերացրատիվ են:', 'az': 'Əbstraktiv metin qeyd edilməsinin son sürəti çox böyük öyrənməli seçmə-to-sequence Transformer modellerinə təvəkkül edir. Bu, hesablama çox pahalıdır. Bu kağıt bu böyük modelləri daha hızlı infeksiya və minimal performanslıq ziyana uğramaq üçün daha kiçik modellərə ayırmaq istəyir. Pseudo-etiketləmə tabanlı metodlar sequence-to-sequence modellərdə məşhurdur. Bu kağızda, tələbə modelləri üçün öyrənmək üçün pseudo etiketlərini asanlaşdırmaq üçün təsirlərin sıcaklıqlarını manipul edir. Üç yığışdırma veri qurularımızda eksperimentlərimiz bizim təbliğ edilmiş metodumuzun vanilla pseudo etiketli metodlarını düzgün göstərir. Daha çox empirik analizi göstərir ki, öğrencilərimiz yaratdığı pseudo etiketlər və toplamlar daha qısa və daha abstraktivdir.', 'bs': 'Nedavni napredak sažetka abstraktivnog teksta u velikoj mjeri oslanja na velike predobučene modele transformera do sekvence, koji su računalno skupi. Ovaj papir je cilj destilacije tih velikih modela u manje za brže infekcije i minimalne gubitke funkcije. Metade osnovane na etiketi psiho su popularne u destilaciji modela sekvence do sekvence. U ovom papiru, jednostavno manipuliramo temperaturu pažnje u transformatorima može olakšati pseudo etikete da naučimo za studentske modele. Naši eksperimenti na tri sažetke podataka pokazuju da naša predložena metoda konsekventno poboljšava metode bazirane na pseudo-etiketi vanile. Daljnja empirička analiza pokazuje da su i pseudo etikete i sažetke proizvedene od naših studenata kraći i apstraktivniji.', 'ca': "El progrès recent de la resumització abstracta del text es basa en gran part en grans models de transformació de seqüència a seqüència, que són costosos per a la computació. Aquest paper té l'objectiu de destilar aquests grans models en petits per a una inferència més ràpida i amb una pèrdua mínima de rendiment. Els mètodes basats en la pseudoetiquetada són populars en la distillació de models secuencials. En aquest article, trobem que manipular les temperatures d'atenció dels Transformers pot facilitar l'aprenentatge de pseudoetiquetes per als models d'estudiants. Els nostres experiments en tres conjunts de dades de resum mostren que el nostre mètode proposat millora constantment els mètodes basats en pseudoetiquetes de vanilla. Una altra anàlisi empírica mostra que tant les etiquetes pseudo com els resums produïts pels nostres estudiants són més curtes i abstractes.", 'cs': 'Nedávný pokrok abstraktivního textového shrnutí se do značné míry opírá o velké předem trénované transformátorové modely, které jsou výpočetně nákladné. Tento článek si klade za cíl destilovat tyto velké modely do menších modelů pro rychlejší odvoz a s minimální ztrátou výkonu. Metody založené na pseudoznačování jsou populární při modelové destilaci sekvence k sekvenci. V tomto článku zjišťujeme, že jednoduchá manipulace teplot pozornosti v transformátorech může usnadnit učení pseudo etiket pro studentské modely. Naše experimenty na třech souhrnných datových sadách ukazují, že naše navrhovaná metoda důsledně zlepšuje metody založené na pseudoznačování vanilky. Další empirická analýza ukazuje, že jak pseudoznačení, tak shrnutí našich studentů jsou kratší a abstraktivnější.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক অট্রাক্টিভ টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত অগ্রগতি বিশেষ করে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স-ব্যবহারকারী মডেলের উপর নির্ভর কর এই পত্রিকাটির লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে এই বড় মডেলগুলো দ্রুত আক্রান্ত এবং নিম্নলিখিত ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত করার জন্য ছোট ছোট ছোট ছোট সেইউডো-ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স মোডেল বিচ্ছিন্ন করে জনপ্রিয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শুধুমাত্র ট্রান্সফর্মারে মনোযোগ আকর্ষণের আবহাওয়া তাপমাত্রা শিক্ষার্থীদের মডেলের জন্য শিখতে সহজে ল আমাদের তিনটি সার্মিজেশন ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সবসময় ভাবে ভ্যানিলা পিসুডো লেব আরো ক্ষমতাশালী বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ছাত্রদের দ্বারা উভয় লেবেল এবং সামারিক সংক্ষেপ কম এবং আরো বেশী নির্ভর করে।', 'et': 'Abstraktse teksti kokkuvõtte hiljutine areng tugineb suurel määral suurtele eelnevalt väljaõpetatud jadast järjestusse muundajate mudelitele, mis on arvutuslikult kallid. Käesoleva töö eesmärk on destilleerida need suured mudelid väiksemateks, et saavutada kiirem järeldus ja minimaalne jõudluskadu. Pseudomärgistusel põhinevad meetodid on populaarsed järjestusest järjestuseni mudelite destilleerimisel. Selles töös leiame, et lihtsalt tähelepanu temperatuuride manipuleerimine Transformerites võib muuta pseudosiltide õppimise lihtsamaks õpilaste mudelite jaoks. Meie kolme kokkuvõtliku andmekogumi katsed näitavad, et meie kavandatud meetod parandab järjekindlalt vanilje pseudomärgistamisel põhinevaid meetodeid. Edasine empiiriline analüüs näitab, et nii pseudomärgised kui ka meie õpilaste koostatud kokkuvõtted on lühemad ja abstraktsemad.', 'fi': 'Abstraktisen tekstin yhteenvedon viimeaikainen kehitys perustuu suurelta osin suuriin esikoulutettuihin sekvenssi-sekvenssimalleihin, jotka ovat laskennallisesti kalliita. Tämän artikkelin tavoitteena on tislata nämä suuret mallit pienempiin malleihin nopeampaa päättelyä varten ja minimaalisella suorituskyvyn menetyksellä. Pseudomointiin perustuvat menetelmät ovat suosittuja sekvenssimallitislauksessa. Tässä artikkelissa huomaamme, että huomiolämpötilojen manipulointi Transformereissa voi helpottaa pseudotarrojen oppimista opiskelijamalleille. Kokeemme kolmesta yhteenvetoaineistosta osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä parantaa johdonmukaisesti vaniljan pseudomerkintäpohjaisia menetelmiä. Empiirinen analyysi osoittaa, että sekä pseudomerkinnät että opiskelijoiden tuottamat tiivistelmät ovat lyhyempiä ja abstraktisempia.', 'he': 'התקדמות האחרונה של סכם טקסט אוסטרקטיבי תלוי בעיקר על דוגמנים גדולים מתאמנים מראש לרצף-לרצף הנייר הזה מכוון למתוח את הדוגמנים הגדולים האלה לתוך דוגמנים קטנים יותר למסקנה מהירה ובאובדן ביצועים מינימלי. שיטות מבוססות על תוויות פסאודו פופולריות במדגמנים מסורה לשורה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מוצאים פשוט מניפולציה בטמפרטורות תשומת לב בטרנספורטרים יכול להקל יותר את תוויות פסאודו ללמוד לדוגמנים סטודנטים. הניסויים שלנו על שלושה קבוצות נתונים של הסיוריזציה מראים שהשיטה המוצעת שלנו משתפרת באופן קבוע שיטות מבוססות על טביעות וונילה. ניתוח אמפירית נוספת מראה שגם תוויות פסאודו וגם סדרות שנוצרות על ידי התלמידים שלנו קצרים יותר ויותר אסטרקטיביים.', 'jv': 'text-decorationtextattr Aparat iki dadi mbukak tanggal manut iki, dadi mbut kuwi tindan bakal luwih apik lan nganggo perbudhakan bakal nggawe barang query-criteria Nyong ngomong karo mapan iki, kita ngubah perusahaan sakjane sakjane sakjane nguasakno Name Terus empirhik karo hal-hal ngono kuwi gambar dadi, akeh pse ngono resmi sing ngejaraké awak dhéwé kuwi mau sing mbut lan ujaran langgar.', 'bo': "འཕྲལ་མྱུར་བའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དེ་གྲངས ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་ནི་མིག Pseudo-labeling based methods are popular in sequence-to-sequence model distillation. In this paper, we find simply manipulating attention temperatures in Transformers can make pseudo labels easier to learn for students' models. ང་ཚོའི་experiments on three summarization datasets show our proposed method consistently improves vanilla pseudo-labeling based methods. Further empirical analysis shows that both pseudo labels and summaries produced by our students are shorter and more abstractive.", 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis Wannan takardan aiki na yi nufin ka rarraba waɗannan masu girma zuwa ƙarami masu ƙaranci wa kasa kasi sauri kuma da hasara ta ƙarami. KCharselect unicode block name Daga wannan takardan, za mu iya iya zartar da kwanan kwanan muhimmada a cikin Transformers, sai ya iya sauƙin su sanar wa misalin mutane. Kayan jarrabayenmu a kan data ta ƙararin uku, yana nũna metoden da aka buƙata, yana ƙari kowanmu da hanyõyin da aka rubũta ta baka bakwai. Ana ƙari ya nuna cewa labo na basudo da ƙarami wanda na samar da ardayanmu sun yi ƙaranci kuma masu kanana.', 'sk': 'Nedavni napredek abstraktivnega povzetka besedila je v veliki meri odvisen od velikih predhodno usposobljenih transformatorskih modelov, ki so računalniško dragi. Cilj tega prispevka je destilirati te velike modele v manjše modele za hitrejše sklepanje in z minimalno izgubo zmogljivosti. Metode, ki temeljijo na psevdoznačevanju, so priljubljene pri destilaciji modela od zaporedja do zaporedja. V tem članku smo ugotovili, da lahko preprosto manipuliranje temperatur pozornosti v transformatorjih olajša učenje psevdo etiket za modele študentov. Naši poskusi na treh naborih podatkov o povzetku kažejo, da naša predlagana metoda dosledno izboljšuje metode na podlagi psevdoznačevanja vanilije. Nadaljnja empirična analiza kaže, da so psevdo oznake in povzetki, ki jih izdelajo naši študenti, krajši in bolj abstraktivni.'}
{'en': 'Learning Disentangled Semantic Representations for Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Multilingual Machine Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'نحو تحقيق أقصى استفادة من النقل عبر اللغات للترجمة الآلية العصبية بدون طلقة', 'pt': 'Para aproveitar ao máximo a transferência entre idiomas para tradução automática neural de tiro zero', 'fr': 'Tirer le meilleur parti du transfert multilingue pour la traduction automatique neuronale zéro coup', 'es': 'Hacia sacar el máximo provecho de la transferencia multilingüe para la traducción automática neuronal sin posibilidades', 'zh': '充跨言移零次性神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'शून्य शॉट न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर के अधिकांश बनाने की दिशा में', 'ja': 'ゼロショット神経機械翻訳のためにクロスリンガル転送を最大限に活用する', 'ru': 'На пути к максимальной межъязыковой передаче для нулевого нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': "I dTreo An Leas is Fearr a Bhaint as Aistriú Trastheangach d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach Zero-shot", 'ka': 'უფრო მეტი სიგრძალური ტრანსპერაციის გავაკეთება', 'hu': 'Úton, hogy a legtöbbet hozzuk ki a nyelvközi transzferből a zéró lövéses neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Για να αξιοποιήσουμε στο έπακρο τη διασυνοριακή μεταφορά για μηδενική νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'kk': 'Нөл- шектелген невралдық машинаның аудармасының көпшілік тілікті аудару үшін', 'it': 'Per sfruttare al meglio il trasferimento translinguistico per la traduzione automatica neurale a scatto zero', 'mk': 'Напред да се искористи најдобриот трансфер на крослингвален превод за превод на неврални машини со нула пукање', 'lt': 'Siekiant kuo labiau panaudoti tarpkalbinį perdavimą nulinės nuotolinės neurologinės mašinos vertimui', 'ms': 'Ke arah Membuat Pemindahan Selasa-Lingua Kebanyakan untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural Zero-Shot', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്ക് ഏറ്റവും ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി സെറോ- ഷോട്ട് ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ', 'mn': 'Нэг-Shot мэдрэлийн машин орчуулахын тулд хамгийн олон хэлбэрийн дамжуулалт хийх', 'mt': 'Lejn l-aħjar użu mit-trasferiment translingwali għat-traduzzjoni tal-makkinarju newrali żero-shot', 'no': 'Gå til å lage dei fleste krysslingsoverføringane for null-Shot neuralmaskinsomsetjinga', 'ro': 'Către valorificarea la maximum a transferului translingvistic pentru traducerea automată neurală zero-shot', 'pl': 'W kierunku maksymalnego wykorzystania transferu między językami dla tłumaczenia maszynowego zerowo-strzałowego neuronowego', 'sr': 'Napred pravljenja najvećeg prekršnog prevoza za nulo-pucanje neuronskog prevođenja mašine', 'sv': 'Mot att göra det mesta av tvärspråklig överföring för noll-skott neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Towards Making the Most of Cross-Lingual Transfer for Zero-Shot Neural Machine Translation', 'si': 'සීරෝ- වෙඩි න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය වෙනුවෙන් වැඩිම ක්\u200dරොස් ලින්ගුල් ස්ථානය කරන්න', 'so': 'Towards Making Most Cross-Lingual Transfer for Zero-Shot Neural Machine Translation', 'ur': 'صفر-شٹ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے بہترین کرس-لینگئال ترجمہ بنانے کی طرف', 'uz': 'Towards Making the Most of Cross-Lingual Transfer for Zero-Shot Neural Machine Translation', 'vi': 'Sắp sửa truyền dịch đa năng ngôn ngữ cho máy thần kinh bị quay không ảnh hưởng', 'bg': 'Към извличане на максимума от междулингвистичния трансфер за нулев изстрел неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Naar het maximale halen van crosslinguale overdracht voor zero-shot neurale machinevertaling', 'da': 'På vej mod at få mest muligt ud af tværsproglig overførsel til Zero-Shot Neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Na putu stvaranja najvećeg prekršnog prevoza za nulo-pucanje neuronskog prevođenja stroja', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg, das Beste aus dem sprachübergreifenden Transfer für die Zero-Shot-neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung zu machen', 'fa': 'به سمت ساختن بیشترین انتقال متصل زبان برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی صفر', 'ko': '크로스 언어의 이동을 충분히 이용하여 제로 박자 신경 기계 번역을 실현하다', 'id': 'Ke arah Membuat Transfer Linguan Semakin Banyak untuk Translation Mesin Neural Zero-Shot', 'sw': 'Mpaka na Kutengeneza Usafiri wa Kilingi zaidi wa Utafiti wa Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'af': 'Gaan na Maak die mees van Kruis- Linguale Oordrag vir Zero- Shot Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'tr': 'Zero-Shot Neural Maşynyň terjimesine iň köp Hat Transferi Bejermek üçin', 'sq': 'Në drejtim të përdorimit më të madh të transferimit ndërgjuhësor për përkthimin e makinës neurale zero-shot', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Որպեսզի ամենաշատն օգտագործենք միջլեզվային փոխանցումը զրո-կրակի նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար', 'az': 'Sıfır-vuruş nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün ən çox çətin tərəfindən istifadə etməyə tərəf', 'bn': 'শুট নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য সর্বোচ্চ ক্রস-লিঙ্গুয়াল ট্রান্সফার তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Napred pravljenja najvećeg prekršnog prevoza za nulo-pucanju neuronskog prevođenja stroja', 'ca': 'Vers aprofitar el transfert translingüe per traducció de màquines neurals sense dispars', 'cs': 'K maximálnímu využití mezijazyčného transferu pro nulový neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Võimalikult palju kasutada keeleülest ülekannet Zero-Shot neuroalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Kohti monikielisen siirron hyödyntämistä nollashotin neurokääntämiseen', 'he': 'לעבור הכי הרבה מעברת לינגולית ללא יריות', 'sk': 'K čim boljšemu izkoriščanju medjezikovnega prenosa za strojno prevajanje nevronov brez strela', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Ngatok Maksuh akeh sing Terjamahan kanggo Ketok-Lingmul Trampen kanggo 0-shot Neral Masine Terjamahan', 'bo': 'Towards Making the most of Cross-Lingual Transfer for Zero-Shot Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Multilingual pre-trained models are able to zero-shot transfer knowledge from rich-resource to low-resource languages in machine reading comprehension (MRC). However, inherent linguistic discrepancies in different languages could make answer spans predicted by zero-shot transfer violate syntactic constraints of the target language. In this paper, we propose a novel multilingual MRC framework equipped with a Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) to disassociate semantics from syntax in representations learned by multilingual pre-trained models. To explicitly transfer only semantic knowledge to the target language, we propose two groups of losses tailored for semantic and syntactic encoding and disentanglement. Experimental results on three multilingual MRC datasets (i.e., XQuAD, MLQA, and TyDi QA) demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach over models based on mBERT and XLM-100.', 'ar': 'توضح هذه الورقة أن التدريب المسبق متعدد اللغات والضبط الدقيق متعدد اللغات مهمان لتسهيل النقل عبر اللغات في الترجمة بدون طلقة ، حيث يتم اختبار نموذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) على لغات المصدر غير المرئية أثناء التدريب الخاضع للإشراف. باتباع هذه الفكرة ، نقدم SixT + ، نموذج NMT قوي متعدد إلى الإنجليزية يدعم 100 لغة مصدر ولكن يتم تدريبه باستخدام مجموعة بيانات متوازية بست لغات مصدر فقط. يقوم SixT + بتهيئة تضمين وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير الكامل مع XLM-R كبير ثم يقوم بتدريب طبقات التشفير وفك التشفير باستخدام إستراتيجية تدريب بسيطة على مرحلتين. يحقق SixT + أداءً رائعًا في الترجمة من عدة لغات إلى الإنجليزية. إنه يتفوق بشكل كبير على CRISS و m2m-100 ، وهما نظامان قويان متعددو اللغات NMT ، بمتوسط ربح يبلغ 7.2 و 5.0 BLEU على التوالي. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تقدم SixT + مجموعة من معلمات النموذج التي يمكن ضبطها بشكل أفضل للمهام الأخرى غير الخاضعة للإشراف. نوضح أن إضافة تهيئة SixT + تتفوق على أحدث طرازات NMT المصممة بشكل صريح على Si <-> En و Ne <-> En بأكثر من 1.2 متوسط BLEU. عند تطبيقه على تلخيص تجريدي متعدد اللغات بدون طلقة ، ينتج عنه متوسط مكاسب في الأداء يبلغ 12.3 ROUGE-L على mBART-ft. نجري تحليلات مفصلة لفهم المكونات الرئيسية لـ SixT + ، بما في ذلك تعدد اللغات للبيانات المتوازية المساعدة ، والتشفير الموضعي غير المتشابك ، وإمكانية النقل عبر اللغات لبرنامج التشفير الخاص به.', 'pt': 'Este artigo demonstra que o pré-treinamento multilíngue e o ajuste fino multilíngue são críticos para facilitar a transferência multilíngue na tradução zero-shot, onde o modelo de tradução automática neural (NMT) é testado em idiomas de origem não vistos durante o treinamento supervisionado. Seguindo essa ideia, apresentamos o SixT+, um forte modelo NMT de muitos para inglês que suporta 100 idiomas de origem, mas é treinado com um conjunto de dados paralelo em apenas seis idiomas de origem. O SixT+ inicializa a incorporação do decodificador e o codificador completo com XLM-R grande e, em seguida, treina as camadas do codificador e do decodificador com uma estratégia de treinamento simples de dois estágios. SixT+ alcança um desempenho impressionante na tradução de muitos para inglês. Ele supera significativamente o CRISS e o m2m-100, dois fortes sistemas NMT multilíngues, com um ganho médio de 7,2 e 5,0 BLEU, respectivamente. Além disso, SixT+ oferece um conjunto de parâmetros de modelo que podem ser ajustados para outras tarefas não supervisionadas. Demonstramos que adicionar a inicialização SixT+ supera os modelos NMT não supervisionados de última geração explicitamente projetados em Si<->En e Ne<->En por mais de 1,2 BLEU médio. Quando aplicado à sumarização abstrativa multilíngue zero-shot, produz um ganho médio de desempenho de 12,3 ROUGE-L sobre mBART-ft. Conduzimos análises detalhadas para entender os principais ingredientes do SixT+, incluindo a multilinguagem dos dados paralelos auxiliares, o codificador desembaraçado posicional e a transferibilidade entre idiomas de seu codificador.', 'es': 'Este documento demuestra que el preentrenamiento multilingüe y el ajuste multilingüe son fundamentales para facilitar la transferencia multilingüe en la traducción cero, donde el modelo de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) se prueba en idiomas de origen que no se han visto durante la capacitación supervisada. Siguiendo esta idea, presentamos SiXT+, un sólido modelo de NMT de muchos a inglés que admite 100 idiomas de origen, pero que está entrenado con un conjunto de datos paralelo en solo seis idiomas de origen. SiXT+ inicializa la incrustación del decodificador y el codificador completo con XLM-R grande y, a continuación, entrena las capas del codificador y el decodificador con una estrategia de entrenamiento simple de dos etapas. SiXT+ logra un rendimiento impresionante en la traducción de muchos a inglés. Supera significativamente a CRISS y m2m-100, dos potentes sistemas NMT multilingües, con una ganancia media de 7,2 y 5,0 BLEU respectivamente. Además, SiXT+ ofrece un conjunto de parámetros de modelo que se pueden ajustar aún más a otras tareas no supervisadas. Demostramos que la adición de inicialización SiXT+ supera a los modelos NMT no supervisados diseñados explícitamente de última generación en Si<->En y Ne<->En en más de 1.2 BLEU promedio. Cuando se aplica a la sumarización abstractiva multilingüe de tiro cero, produce una ganancia de rendimiento promedio de 12,3 ROUGE-L sobre MBART-ft. Llevamos a cabo análisis detallados para comprender los ingredientes clave de SiXT+, incluidos el multilingüismo de los datos paralelos auxiliares, el codificador posicional desenredado y la transferibilidad multilingüe de su codificador.', 'fr': "Cet article démontre que la pré-formation multilingue et le réglage fin multilingue sont tous deux essentiels pour faciliter le transfert interlinguistique dans la traduction zero-shot, où le modèle de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) est testé sur des langues sources invisibles pendant la formation supervisée. Suivant cette idée, nous présentons SiXT+, un modèle NMT puissant de plusieurs vers l'anglais qui prend en charge 100 langues sources mais qui est formé avec un ensemble de données parallèle dans six langues sources seulement. SixT+ initialise l'intégration du décodeur et l'encodeur complet avec XLM-R large, puis entraîne les couches de codeur et de décodeur avec une stratégie d'apprentissage simple en deux étapes. SixT+ atteint des performances impressionnantes en matière de traduction de plusieurs vers l'anglais. Il surpasse largement CRISS et m2m-100, deux puissants systèmes NMT multilingues, avec un gain moyen de 7,2 et 5,0 BLEU respectivement. En outre, SixT+ propose un ensemble de paramètres de modèle qui peuvent être affinés pour d'autres tâches non supervisées. Nous démontrons que l'ajout de l'initialisation SiXT+ surpasse les modèles NMT non supervisés de pointe explicitement conçus sur Si<->En et Ne<->En de plus de 1,2 UEBL en moyenne. Lorsqu'elle est appliquée à la synthèse abstraite interlinguale à jet zéro, elle produit un gain de performance moyen de 12,3 ROUGE-L sur mbart-ft. Nous effectuons des analyses détaillées pour comprendre les ingrédients clés de SiXT+, y compris la multilinguité des données parallèles auxiliaires, le codeur démêlé de position et la transférabilité multilingue de son codeur.", 'ja': 'この論文は、多言語の事前トレーニングと多言語の微調整が、ゼロショット翻訳でのクロスリンガル転送を容易にするために重要であることを実証している。ここでは、ニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）モデルが、監督下のトレーニング中に見られないソース言語でテストされている。 このアイデアに従って、私たちはSixT +を発表します。SixT +は、100のソース言語をサポートしながらも、6つのソース言語のみで並列データセットを使用してトレーニングされる、強力な多対英語NMTモデルです。 SixT +は、デコーダーの埋め込みとフルエンコーダーをXLM - R大で初期化し、エンコーダーとデコーダーレイヤーを簡単な2段階のトレーニング戦略でトレーニングします。 SixT +は、多言語から英語への翻訳で印象的なパフォーマンスを実現します。 2つの強力な多言語NMTシステムであるCRISSとm 2 m -100を大幅に上回り、平均利得はそれぞれ7.2と5.0 BLEUです。 さらに、SixT +は、監督されていない他のタスクにさらに微調整できる一連のモデルパラメータを提供します。 SixT +初期化を追加すると、Si &lt;-&gt; EnおよびNe &lt;-&gt; Enの最先端の設計された明示的に監督されていないNMTモデルを平均して1.2以上上回ることを実証しました。 ゼロショットのクロスリンガル抽象的な要約に適用すると、mBART - ftを上回る12.3 ROUGE - Lの平均パフォーマンスゲインが得られます。 補助並列データの多言語性、位置分離されていないエンコーダ、エンコーダのクロスリンガル転送性など、SixT +の主要な成分を理解するための詳細な分析を行っています。', 'zh': '本文明,多言预练及多语言微调零次译中跨语移重,其神经机器翻译(NMT)模形于监督不见之源语试之。 循此心,吾发其SixT +,此强大之NMT,持100种源言,但仅用六语者并行数集。 SixT+ 用 XLM-R 大初解码器嵌完编码器,然后练策练编码器解码器层。 SixT+ 于多英译得深性。 其形显优于CRISSm2m-100,此两强多言NMT统,均益为7.25.0 BLEU。 SixT+ 给一朋之参数,可以无监督之参数。 臣等证添 SixT+ 初始化性能优于 Si<->En 、 Ne<->En 上最先进者显式计无监督 NMT 模,均BLEU过 1.2 。 当用于零次跨语抽摘要,生于mBART-ft12.3 ROUGE-L之均而益之。 臣等详之,以知SixT+之要,兼赞并行数据之多语言性,位离编码器及编码器之跨言可转移性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर दर्शाता है कि बहुभाषी प्रीट्रेनिंग और बहुभाषी फाइन-ट्यूनिंग दोनों शून्य-शॉट अनुवाद में क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण हैं, जहां न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) मॉडल का परीक्षण पर्यवेक्षित प्रशिक्षण के दौरान अनदेखी स्रोत भाषाओं पर किया जाता है। इस विचार के बाद, हम सिक्सटी + पेश करते हैं, एक मजबूत कई-से-अंग्रेजी एनएमटी मॉडल जो 100 स्रोत भाषाओं का समर्थन करता है लेकिन केवल छह स्रोत भाषाओं में समानांतर डेटासेट के साथ प्रशिक्षित है। SixT + एक्सएलएम-आर बड़े के साथ डिकोडर एम्बेडिंग और पूर्ण एन्कोडर को प्रारंभ करता है और फिर एक सरल दो-चरण प्रशिक्षण रणनीति के साथ एन्कोडर और डिकोडर परतों को प्रशिक्षित करता है। SixT+ कई-से-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद पर प्रभावशाली प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। यह क्रमशः 7.2 और 5.0 BLEU के औसत लाभ के साथ दो मजबूत बहुभाषी NMT प्रणालियों, CRISS और m2m-100, को काफी हद तक पीछे छोड़ देता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, SixT+ मॉडल पैरामीटर का एक सेट प्रदान करता है जिसे अन्य असुरक्षित कार्यों के लिए और ठीक किया जा सकता है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि सिक्सटी + इनिशियलाइजेशन को जोड़ना राज्य-के-कला को स्पष्ट रूप से सी<->एन और एनई<->एन पर 1.2 औसत BLEU से अधिक डिजाइन किए गए अप्रकाशित एनएमटी मॉडल को बेहतर बनाता है। जब शून्य-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल अमूर्त सारांशीकरण पर लागू किया जाता है, तो यह mBART-ft पर 12.3 रूज-एल का औसत प्रदर्शन लाभ पैदा करता है। हम सिक्सटी + की प्रमुख सामग्री को समझने के लिए विस्तृत विश्लेषण करते हैं, जिसमें सहायक समानांतर डेटा की बहुभाषीता, स्थितिगत विघटित एनकोडर और इसके एन्कोडर की क्रॉस-लिंगुअल हस्तांतरणीयता शामिल है।', 'ru': 'Эта статья демонстрирует, что многоязычное предварительное обучение и многоязычная тонкая настройка имеют решающее значение для облегчения межязыковой передачи в нулевом переводе, где модель нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) тестируется на исходных языках, невидимых во время контролируемого обучения. Следуя этой идее, мы представляем SixT+, сильную модель NMT, которая поддерживает 100 исходных языков, но обучена параллельному набору данных только на шести исходных языках. SixT+ инициализирует встраивание декодера и полный кодер с большим XLM-R, а затем обучает уровни кодера и декодера простой двухэтапной стратегией обучения. SixT+ достигает впечатляющих результатов при переводе со многих языков на английский. Он значительно превосходит CRISS и m2m-100, две сильные многоязычные системы NMT, со средним коэффициентом усиления 7,2 и 5,0 BLEU соответственно. Кроме того,SixT + предлагает набор параметров модели, которые могут быть дополнительно настроены для других неконтролируемых задач. Мы демонстрируем, что добавление инициализации SixT + превосходит современные явно разработанные неконтролируемые модели NMT на Si&lt;-&gt;En и Ne&lt;-&gt;En более чем на 1,2 среднего BLEU. При применении к кросс-лингвальному абстрактному обобщению с нулевым выстрелом он дает среднее усиление производительности 12,3 ROUGE-L по сравнению с mBART-ft. Мы проводим детальный анализ, чтобы понять ключевые ингредиентыSixT +, включая многоязычность вспомогательных параллельных данных, позиционный разрозненный кодер и кросс-лингвистическую передаваемость его кодера.', 'ga': 'Léiríonn an páipéar seo go bhfuil réamhoiliúint ilteangach agus mionchoigeartú ilteangach ríthábhachtach chun aistriú tras-teangach in aistriúchán nialasach a éascú, áit a ndéantar samhail an aistriúcháin mheaisín néaraigh (NMT) a thástáil ar bhunteangacha nach bhfeictear le linn oiliúna maoirsithe. Ag leanúint leis an smaoineamh seo, cuirimid i láthair SixT+, samhail láidir NMT lán-go-Béarla a thacaíonn le 100 teanga foinseach ach atá oilte le tacar sonraí comhthreomhar i sé theanga fhoinseach amháin. Cuireann SixT+ tús le neadú an díchódóra agus an t-ionchódóir iomlán le XLM-R mór agus ansin cuireann sé oiliúint ar na sraitheanna ionchódóra agus díchódóra le straitéis oiliúna dhá chéim shimplí. Baineann SixT+ feidhmíocht shuntasach amach ar aistriúchán go Béarla. Is fearr go mór é CISS agus m2m-100, dhá chóras láidre ilteangacha NMT, le meánghnóthachan 7.2 agus 5.0 BLEU faoi seach. Ina theannta sin, cuireann SixT+ sraith de pharaiméadair mhúnla ar fáil ar féidir iad a mhionchoigeartú tuilleadh le tascanna eile gan mhaoirseacht. Léirímid go n-éiríonn níos fearr leis na samhlacha NMT úrscothach atá deartha go sainráite ar Si<->En agus Ne<->En trí thúsú SixT+ a chur le breis agus 1.2 meán BLEU. Nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm é ar achoimriú teibí tras-teangach náid-lámhaigh, táirgeann sé meánghnóthachan feidhmíochta de 12.3 ROUGE-L thar mBART-ft. Déanaimid anailís mhionsonraithe chun príomh-chomhábhair SixT+ a thuiscint, lena n-áirítear ilteangachas na sonraí cúnta comhthreomhara, an t-ionchódóir dícheangailte suímh, agus inaistritheacht tras-teangach a ionchódóra.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს, რომ მრავალენგური წარმოდგენები და მრავალენგური წარმოდგენები ორივე კრიტიკურია სიტყვეტის გადატანისათვის, რომელიც ნეიროლური მანქანის გადატანისათვის (NMT) მოდელის შემდეგ შე ამ იდეის შემდეგ, ჩვენ SixT+, ძალიან ბევრი ანგლისური NMT მოდელს, რომელიც 100 წიგნის ენების მხარდაჭირება, მაგრამ მხოლოდ ქვსი წიგნის პარალელური მონაცემებით განაცემულ Name SixT+ მიიღება ინტერფექციური გამოყენება ბევრი ანგლისური განგორმაციაში. ეს მნიშვნელოვანია CRISS და m2m-100, ორი ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი NMT სისტემები, რომელიც სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა 7.2 და 5.0 BLEU. დამატებით, SixT+ მოდელური პარამეტრების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც შეიძლება დამატებით კონფიგურაცია სხვა არსებული დავალებისთვის. ჩვენ ევმონსტრაცით, რომ SixT+ инициаლიზაციის დამატება უფრო გავაკეთება სი<->ან და ნელ<->ან 1,2 მეზემი BLEU-ის განმატებული NMT მოდელები. როდესაც ნულ-სურათი კრესტრაქტიური აბსტრაქტიური სიმბოლოებისთვის გამოყენებულია, ეს 12.3 ROUGE-L-ს mBART-ft-ზე მეშვეულად გამოყენებს. ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული ანალიზები, რომ გავიგოთ SixT+-ის კლავისური ინგრედიენტების მრავალური ინგრედიენტები, შესახებ მ', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja, hogy a többnyelvű előképzés és a többnyelvű finomhangolás egyaránt kritikus fontosságú a keresztnyelvű transzfer megkönnyítéséhez a nulla-shot fordításban, ahol a neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) modellt felügyelt képzés során nem látható forrásnyelveken tesztelik. Ezt az ötletet követve bemutatjuk a SixT+-t, egy erős, sok-angol nyelvű NMT modellt, amely 100 forrásnyelvet támogat, de egy párhuzamos adatkészlettel képzett, mindössze hat forrásnyelven. A SixT+ inicializálja a dekóder beágyazását és a teljes kódolót XLM-R nagy segítségével, majd egy egyszerű kétlépcsős képzési stratégiával edzi a kódoló és dekódoló rétegeket. A SixT+ lenyűgöző teljesítményt ér el a sok angol fordításban. Jelentősen felülmúlja a CRISS és az m2m-100, két erős többnyelvű NMT rendszert, átlagosan 7,2 és 5,0 BLEU nyereséggel. Ezenkívül a SixT+ modellparamétereket is kínál, amelyek tovább finomíthatók más felügyelet nélküli feladatokhoz. Bemutatjuk, hogy a SixT+ inicializáció hozzáadása több mint 1,2 átlagos BLEU-val felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb, kifejezetten felügyelet nélküli NMT modelleket Si<->En és Ne<->En modelleken. A nullás nyelvű absztraktív összefoglalásra alkalmazva átlagosan 12,3 ROUGE-L teljesítménynövekedést eredményez mBART-ft fölött. Részletes elemzéseket végzünk a SixT+ kulcsfontosságú összetevőinek megértésére, beleértve a kiegészítő párhuzamos adatok többnyelvűségét, a pozíciós kiosztott kódolót és a kódoló keresztnyelvű transzferálhatóságát.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία καταδεικνύει ότι η πολύγλωσση προεπιλογή και η πολύγλωσση τελειοποίηση είναι κρίσιμες για τη διευκόλυνση της διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς στη μετάφραση μηδενικού πυροβολισμού, όπου το μοντέλο νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) δοκιμάζεται σε γλώσσες προέλευσης που δεν φαίνονται κατά τη διάρκεια της εποπτευόμενης εκπαίδευσης. Ακολουθώντας αυτή την ιδέα, παρουσιάζουμε ένα ισχυρό μοντέλο που υποστηρίζει 100-γλώσσες προέλευσης αλλά εκπαιδεύεται με παράλληλο σύνολο δεδομένων σε μόνο έξι γλώσσες προέλευσης. Το αρχικοποιεί την ενσωμάτωση αποκωδικοποιητή και τον πλήρη κωδικοποιητή με μεγάλο και στη συνέχεια εκπαιδεύει τα στρώματα κωδικοποιητή και αποκωδικοποιητή με μια απλή στρατηγική κατάρτισης δύο σταδίων. Το επιτυγχάνει εντυπωσιακή απόδοση σε μετάφραση πολλών σε Αγγλικά. Υπερνικά σημαντικά τα δύο ισχυρά πολυγλωσσικά συστήματα με μέσο κέρδος 7.2 και 5.0 αντίστοιχα. Επιπλέον, το προσφέρει ένα σύνολο παραμέτρων μοντέλου που μπορούν να προσαρμοστούν περαιτέρω σε άλλες εργασίες χωρίς επίβλεψη. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η προσθήκη αρχικοποίησης SixT+ ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα ειδικά σχεδιασμένα μοντέλα NMT σε Si<->En και Ne<->En κατά το μέσο όρο BLEU πάνω από 1.2. Όταν εφαρμόζεται στην μηδενική διαγώνια αφηρημένη σύνοψη, παράγει ένα μέσο κέρδος απόδοσης 12.3 σε σχέση με το Διεξάγουμε λεπτομερείς αναλύσεις για να κατανοήσουμε τα βασικά συστατικά του συμπεριλαμβανομένης της πολυγλωσσίας των βοηθητικών παράλληλων δεδομένων, του αποσπασμένου κωδικοποιητή θέσης και της διαγώνιας μεταφοράς του κωδικοποιητή του.', 'it': "Questo articolo dimostra che il pretraining multilingue e la messa a punto multilingue sono entrambi fondamentali per facilitare il trasferimento cross-lingual nella traduzione zero-shot, dove il modello di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) viene testato su lingue di origine invisibili durante l'addestramento supervisionato. Seguendo questa idea, presentiamo SixT+, un solido modello NMT multi-inglese che supporta 100 lingue di origine ma è formato con un set di dati parallelo in sole sei lingue di origine. SixT+ inizializza l'incorporazione del decoder e l'encoder completo con XLM-R large e quindi addestra i livelli di encoder e decoder con una semplice strategia di formazione in due fasi. SixT+ raggiunge prestazioni impressionanti nella traduzione da molti a inglese. Supera significativamente CRISS e m2m-100, due potenti sistemi NMT multilingue, con un guadagno medio rispettivamente di 7,2 e 5,0 BLEU. Inoltre, SixT+ offre una serie di parametri di modello che possono essere ulteriormente perfezionati per altre attività non supervisionate. Dimostriamo che l'aggiunta di inizializzazione SixT+ supera i modelli NMT non supervisionati esplicitamente progettati su Si<->En e Ne<->En di oltre 1,2 BLEU medi. Quando applicato alla sintesi astratta cross-lingual zero-shot, produce un guadagno medio di prestazioni di 12,3 ROUGE-L su mBART-ft. Conduciamo analisi dettagliate per comprendere gli ingredienti chiave di SixT+, tra cui la multilinguità dei dati paralleli ausiliari, l'encoder disantangled posizionale e la trasferibilità cross-lingual del suo encoder.", 'lt': 'Šis dokumentas rodo, kad daugiakalbis išankstinis mokymas ir daugiakalbis patobulinimas yra labai svarbūs siekiant palengvinti tarpkalbinį perdavimą nulinio vaizdo vertimo būdu, kai nervinių mašin ų vertimo (NMT) modelis bandomas naudojant šaltinio kalbas, kurios nenustatytos prižiūrimo mokymo metu. Pagal šią idėją pristatysime SixT+, stiprų daugelio anglų kalbų NMT model į, kuris remia 100 šaltinių kalbų, tačiau yra mokomas lygiagrečiu duomenų rinkiniu tik šešiomis šaltinių kalbomis. SixT+ inicijuoja dekoderio įdėjimą ir visą kodavimo sistemą su XLM-R dideliu dydžiu, o vėliau moko kodavimo ir dekoderio sluoksnius taikant paprastą dviejų etapų mokymo strategiją. SixT+ pasiekia įspūdingų rezultatų daugelio vertimo anglų kalba srityje. It significantly outperforms CRISS and m2m-100, two strong multilingual NMT systems, with an average gain of 7.2 and 5.0 BLEU respectively.  Be to, SixT+ siūlo modelių parametrų rinkinį, kuris gali būti dar labiau pritaikytas prie kitų nepastebimų užduočių. Mes įrodome, kad papildant SixT+ inicializaciją, rezultatai yra naujausi, aiškiai sukurti nepastebimi NMT modeliai Si<->En ir Ne<->En daugiau kaip 1,2 vidutinio BLEU. Taikant nulinės nuotraukos kryžminę abstrakcinę santrauką, ji sukuria vidutinį rezultatų padidėjimą 12,3 ROUGE-L, palyginti su mBART-pėdomis. Mes atliekame išsamią analizę, kad suprastume pagrindines SixT+ sudedamąsias dalis, įskaitant pagalbinių lygiagrečių duomenų daugiakalbystę, padėtį išskiriantį koduotoją ir jo koduotojo tarpkalbinį perdavimą.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз бірнеше тілдерді аудару және бірнеше тілдерді баптауға көп тілдерді аудару үшін көп тілдерді аудару үшін көпшілікті болады дегенді көрсетеді. Невралдық машинаның аудару үлгісі (NMT) бақылау кезінде көрсетілмеген Бұл идеяның соңында SixT+ - 100 көпшілік тілдерді қолдайтын ағылшынша NMT үлгісін көрсету үшін біз тек алты көпшілік тілдерде параллель деректер жинағымен оқылған. SixT+ декодерді ендіру және толық XLM- R үлкен кодерді инициализациялайды. Содан кейін кодерді және декодерді қарапайым екі этап оқыту стратегиясы арқылы көмектеседі. SixT+ көп ағылшын тілінен аудару үшін әсер етеді. Бұл CRISS және m2m-100, екі көп тілді NMT жүйесіне күш жұмыс істейді, 7,2 және 5,0 BLEU орташа жетістікті. Қосымша, SixT+ басқа жоспарламаған тапсырмалар үлгі параметрлерді қолданып береді. Біз SixT+ инициализациясын қосу үшін Si < ->En және Ne < ->En және 1,2 орташа BLEU үшін өзгертілмеген NMT үлгілерін көрсетеді. Нөл түрлі тілік абстрактивті тұжырымдамасына қолданылса, ол көмектесетін параллель деректердің көмектесілігін, көмектесетін кодердің көмектесілігін, көмектесетін кодердің орташа 12,3 ROUGE-L және оның көмектесетін тілік кодердің көмектесілігін түсіну үшін тегжейлі', 'mt': 'This paper demonstrates that multilingual pretraining and multilingual fine-tuning are both critical for facilitating cross-lingual transfer in zero-shot translation, where the neural machine translation (NMT) model is tested on source languages unseen during supervised training.  Wara din l-idea, qed nippreżentaw SixT+, mudell qawwi ta’ NMT b’ħafna għall-Ingliż li jappoġġja 100 lingwa tas-sors iżda huwa mħarreġ b’sett ta’ dejta parallel f’sitt lingwi tas-sors biss. SixT+ inizjalizza l-inkodifikazzjoni tad-dekoder u l-kodifikatur sħiħ b’XLM-R kbir u mbagħad iħarreġ is-saffi tal-kodifikatur u d-dekoder b’strateġija sempliċi ta’ taħriġ f’żewġ stadji. SixT+ tikseb prestazzjoni impressjonanti fuq traduzzjoni ta’ ħafna mill-Ingliż. Hija taqbeż b’mod sinifikanti s-CRISS u l-m2m-100, żewġ sistemi NMT multilingwi b’saħħithom, b’żieda medja ta’ 7.2 u 5.0 BLEU rispettivament. Barra minn hekk, is-SixT+ toffri sett ta’ parametri mudell li jistgħu jiġu a ġġustati aktar għal kompiti oħra mhux sorveljati. We demonstrate that adding SixT+ initialization outperforms state-of-the-art explicitly designed unsupervised NMT models on Si<->En and Ne<->En by over 1.2 average BLEU.  Meta applikat għal sommarju astrattiv translingwistiku b’ritmu żero, jipproduċi żieda medja fil-prestazzjoni ta’ 12.3 ROUGE-L fuq mBART-ft. Aħna nagħmlu analiżi dettaljata biex nifhmu l-ingredjenti ewlenin ta’ SixT+, inkluża l-multilingwiċit à tad-dejta parallela awżiljarja, l-ikkodifikatur pożizzjonali diżantangled, u t-trasferibbiltà translingwistika tal-kodifikatur tiegħu.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും മുഴുവന്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതും ശൂന്യമായ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിന് പ്രധാ ഈ ഐഡിയയുടെ പിന്നാലെ നമ്മള്\u200d സിക്സ്റ്റി + സമ്മാനിക്കുന്നു. അത് 100 ഉറവിട ഭാഷകളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ഒരു ശക്തിയായിട്ടും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില എക്സ്\u200cഎംഎംഎം- R വലുതായി ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d എക്സ്റ്റേഡിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെയും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ കോഡെര്\u200d ആരംഭിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് എക്സോഡെര്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡ ഒരുപാട് ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷകളില്\u200d ആറ്റിടി + പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നേ അത് CRISS, m2m-100, രണ്ട് ശക്തിയുള്ള multilingual NMT സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ സാധാരണ 7. 2, 5. 0 ബെല്യൂ നേടുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d നല്ല പരാമീറ്റര്\u200d നല്\u200dകുവാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന സാധ്യതയുള്ള സംയോജകങ്ങള്\u200d ആ സി<->ഏനും നെയും<->ഏനും നെയും നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d 1.2 വയസ്സ് ബിലിയുവില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത NMT മോഡലുകളുടെ സ്ഥാനം വ്യക്തമായി നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു When applied to zero-shot cross-lingual abstractive summarization, it produces an average performance gain of 12.3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. We conduct detailed analyses to understand the key ingredients of SixT+, including multilinguality of the auxiliary parallel data, positional disentangled encoder, and the cross-lingual transferability of its encoder.', 'mk': 'Овој документ покажува дека мултијазичното претренирање и мултијазичното финетизирање се критични за олеснување на прекујазичниот трансфер во превод со нула снимка, каде што моделот на неуралниот машински превод (НМТ) се тестира на изворни јазици кои не се видени за време на надгледуваната Following this idea, we present SixT+, a strong many-to-English NMT model that supports 100 source languages but is trained with a parallel dataset in only six source languages.  SixT+ го иницијализира вградувањето на декодерот и целиот кодер со XLM-R голем и потоа го обучува кодерот и декодерот со едноставна стратегија за обука во две фази. SixT+ achieves impressive performance on many-to-English translation.  Истиот значително го надминува КрИСС и m2m-100, два силни мултијазички НМТ системи, со просечен зголемување од 7,2 и 5,0 БЛЕ. Покрај тоа, SixT+ нуди сет моделни параметри кои може да бидат понатаму прилагодени на други ненадгледувани задачи. We demonstrate that adding SixT+ initialization outperforms state-of-the-art explicitly designed unsupervised NMT models on Si<->En and Ne<->En by over 1.2 average BLEU.  When applied to zero-shot cross-lingual abstractive summarization, it produces an average performance gain of 12.3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. We conduct detailed analyses to understand the key ingredients of SixT+, including multilinguality of the auxiliary parallel data, positional disentangled encoder, and the cross-lingual transferability of its encoder.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь олон хэл хөгжүүлэх болон олон хэл хөгжүүлэх нь хоёулаа хэл хөгжүүлэх нь тэгш шат хөгжүүлэхэд хамгийн чухал гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэвч мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх загвар (NMT) удирдагдсан сургалтын үед харагдахгүй эх үү Энэ санааны дараа бид SixT+, 100 эх үүсвэрийн хэлний дэмжиж буй олон англи хэлний NMT загварын хүчтэй зургаан эх үүсвэрийн хэлний зөвхөн параллел өгөгдлийн сургуультай сургалтыг тайлбарлаж байна. SixT+ декодер болон бүрэн коддогчийг XLM-R том болгон эхлүүлнэ, дараа нь коддогч болон декодер давхарыг энгийн хоёр давхар суралцах стратегийг дамжуулдаг. SixT+ нь олон англи хэлбэрээс илүү гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Энэ нь CRISS болон m2m-100, хоёр хүчтэй олон хэлний NMT системээс илүү үр дүнтэй. 7.2 болон 5.0 BLEU-ын дундаж өндөр байна. Үүнээс гадна SixT+ нь бусад ажил дээр дахин сайжруулж чадах загварын параметрлүүдийг санал болгож байна. Бид SixT+ эхлүүлэлтийг нэмэх нь урлагийн төвшин дээр Si<->En болон Ne<->En-д 1.2 дундаж BLEU-д баталгаагүй NMT загваруудыг тодорхой бүтээсэн гэдгийг харуулж байна. Нэг хэлний хэлбэрээр тэгш хэлний абстрактив хэмжээнд хэрэглэгдсэн үед энэ нь 12.3 ROUGE-L-г mBART-ft-н хувьд дундаж үйлдвэрлэлтийн нэмэлт гаргадаг. Бид SixT+-ын чухал хэмжээсүүдийг ойлгохын тулд нарийвчлан шинжилгээ хийдэг.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł pokazuje, że wielojęzyczne szkolenie wstępne i wielojęzyczne dostosowanie są kluczowe dla ułatwienia transferu między językami w tłumaczeniu zero-shot, gdzie model neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) jest testowany na językach źródłowych niewidocznych podczas nadzorowanego szkolenia. Podążając za tą ideą, przedstawiamy SixT+, silny model NMT wielu na angielski, który obsługuje 100 języków źródłowych, ale jest przeszkolony z równoległym zbiorem danych w tylko sześciu językach źródłowych. SixT+ inicjuje osadzenie dekodera i pełny koder z XLM-R large, a następnie szkoli warstwy kodera i dekodera z prostą dwustopniową strategią szkoleniową. SixT+ osiąga imponującą wydajność w tłumaczeniach wielu na angielski. Znacznie przewyższa CRISS i m2m-100, dwa silne wielojęzyczne systemy NMT, o średnim zysku 7.2 i 5.0 BLEU. Dodatkowo SixT+ oferuje zestaw parametrów modelu, które można dodatkowo dostosować do innych zadań bez nadzoru. Pokazujemy, że dodanie inicjalizacji SixT+ przewyższa najnowocześniejsze modele NMT bez nadzoru na Si<->En i Ne<->En o ponad 1,2 średnią BLEU. Przy zastosowaniu do zero-shot cross-językowej abstrakcyjnej streszczenia, generuje średni wzrost wydajności 12.3 ROUGE-L w porównaniu z mBART-ft. Przeprowadzamy szczegółowe analizy w celu zrozumienia kluczowych składników SixT+, w tym wielojęzyczności pomocniczych danych równoległych, pozycjonalnego rozwiązania kodera oraz możliwości przenoszenia kodera w języku wielojęzycznym.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan bahawa pralatihan berbilang bahasa dan penyesuaian berbilang bahasa kedua-dua adalah kritikal untuk memudahkan pemindahan saling bahasa dalam terjemahan-tembakan sifar, di mana model terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) diuji pada bahasa sumber yang tidak terlihat semasa latihan yang diawasi. Following this idea, we present SixT+, a strong many-to-English NMT model that supports 100 source languages but is trained with a parallel dataset in only six source languages.  SixT+ awalkan penyembedding dekoder dan pengekod penuh dengan XLM-R besar dan kemudian melatih pengekod dan lapisan dekoder dengan strategi latihan dua tahap sederhana. SixT+ achieves impressive performance on many-to-English translation.  It significantly outperforms CRISS and m2m-100, two strong multilingual NMT systems, with an average gain of 7.2 and 5.0 BLEU respectively.  Lagipun, SixT+ menawarkan set parameter model yang boleh disesuaikan lebih lanjut kepada tugas lain yang tidak diawasi. We demonstrate that adding SixT+ initialization outperforms state-of-the-art explicitly designed unsupervised NMT models on Si<->En and Ne<->En by over 1.2 average BLEU.  When applied to zero-shot cross-lingual abstractive summarization, it produces an average performance gain of 12.3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. We conduct detailed analyses to understand the key ingredients of SixT+, including multilinguality of the auxiliary parallel data, positional disentangled encoder, and the cross-lingual transferability of its encoder.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser at fleirspråksomsetjing og fleirspråksomsetjing er både kritisk for å få tilgjengeleg krysspråksomsetjing i nullstilt omsetjing, der modellen for neuralmaskineomsetjing (NMT) vert testa på kjeldespråk som ikkje finst under oversikt øving. Etter denne ideen, presenterer vi SixT+, ein sterk mange til engelsk NMT-modell som støttar 100 kjeldespråk, men er trent med ein parallell dataset i bare seks kjeldespråk. SixT+ startar dekoderinnbygginga og fullstendig kodar med XLM-R stor, og så treng koderelaget og dekoderlaget med ein enkel to stadstreningsstrategi. SixT+ oppnår uttrykkelig utvikling på mange til engelske omsetjingar. Det gjennomsnittlig utfører CRISS og m2m-100, to sterke multispråk NMT-systemet, med gjennomsnittlig høve av 7,2 og 5,0 BLEU. I tillegg offerer SixT+ eit sett modell- parametra som kan finnast meir til andre ulike oppgåver. Vi demonstrerer at å leggja til SixT+-initialisering utfører kunsttilstanden eksplisisk utforma ulike NMT-modeller på Si < ->En og Ne < ->En med over 1,2 gjennomsnittlig BLEU. Når det er brukt til krysspråk abstraktiv sammendrag med null-shot, produserer det gjennomsnittlig utvikling av 12,3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. Vi gjer detaljerte analyser for å forstå nøkkelingredientane av SixT+, inkludert fleirspråk av hjelpelege parallelle data, posisjonell disentanglert koder og krysspråk overføringsfunksjonsfunksjonsfunksjonsfunksjonsfunksjonsfunksjonsfunksjonsf', 'ro': 'Această lucrare demonstrează că pregătirea multilingvă și reglarea fină multilingvă sunt atât esențiale pentru facilitarea transferului interlingv în traducerea zero-shot, în cazul în care modelul de traducere automată neurală (NMT) este testat pe limbi sursă nevăzute în timpul instruirii supravegheate. Urmând această idee, vă prezentăm SixT+, un model puternic NMT multi-to-engleză care acceptă 100 de limbi sursă, dar este instruit cu un set de date paralel în doar șase limbi sursă. SixT+ inițializează încorporarea decodorului și encoderul complet cu XLM-R large și apoi antrenează straturile encoder și decodor cu o strategie simplă de instruire în două etape. SixT+ obține performanțe impresionante la traducerea multor traduceri în limba engleză. Acesta depășește semnificativ CRISS și m2m-100, două sisteme multilingve NMT puternice, cu un câștig mediu de 7,2 și respectiv 5,0 BLEU. În plus, SixT+ oferă un set de parametri de model care pot fi reglați în continuare la alte sarcini nesupravegheate. Demonstrăm că adăugarea inițializării SixT+ depășește modelele NMT de ultimă oră proiectate explicit nesupravegheate pe Si<->En și Ne<->En cu peste 1,2 BLEU mediu. Atunci când se aplică la rezumarea abstractivă încrucișată în împușcături zero, aceasta produce un câștig mediu de performanță de 12,3 ROUGE-L peste mBART-ft. Realizăm analize detaliate pentru a înțelege ingredientele cheie ale SixT+, inclusiv multilingvitatea datelor paralele auxiliare, codificatorul decontangled pozițional și transferabilitatea translingvistică a codificatorului său.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje da su mnogijezički pretvaranje i višejezički pretvaranje kritični za olakšanje preko jezika u prevodu nulog snimka, gde se model prevoda neuralne mašine (NMT) testira na izvornim jezicima koji se ne vidi tokom nadzorne obuke. Nakon ove ideje predstavljamo SixT+, jaki model na engleskom NMT koji podržava 100 izvorskih jezika, ali je obučen paralelnom setom podataka samo na šest izvorskih jezika. SixT+ inicijalizuje uključenje dekodera i puni koder sa velikim XLM-R, a zatim trenira koder i dekoder slojeve jednostavnom strategijom treninga dve faze. SixT+ postiže impresivnu predstavu na prevodu mnogih na engleski. To značajno iznosi CRISS i m2m-100, dve jake multijezičke NMT-sisteme, s prosječnim dobitkom od 7,2 i 5,0 BLEU-a. Dodatno, SixT+ nudi niz modelnih parametara koji mogu biti dodatno ispravljeni drugim neodređenim zadatacima. Pokazujemo da dodavanje SixT+ inicijalizacije iznosi state-of-the-art izravno dizajnirane neodređene NMT modele na Si<->En i Ne<->En za preko 1,2 prosječne BLEU. Kada se primjenjuje na krstojezičku abstraktivnu sažetku nule-pucnjave, proizvodi prosječni uspešni dobitak od 12,3 ROUGE-L iznad mBART-ft. Provodimo detaljne analize kako bi razumeli ključne sastojke SixT+, uključujući multijezičnost pomoćnih paralelnih podataka, položajni disentacionalni koder i preko jezičke prebacivosti svog kodera.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ විශේෂ භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් සහ විශේෂ භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිභාෂාවක් සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය භාෂාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේ මේ අදහසට පස්සේ, අපි 6T+, ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය NMT මොඩේල් එකක් ප්\u200dරධාන කරනවා ඒත් මුළු භාෂාවක Name 6T+ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය වලින් අනුවාදනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා. ඒක ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් CRISS සහ m2m-100, ශක්තිමත් විශේෂ භාෂාවක් NMT පද්ධතිය දෙකක් විතරයි, සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ 7.2 සහ 5.0 BL තවත්, 6T+ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සූදානම් කරනවා මෙහෙම වෙනුවෙන් නැති වැඩක් සඳහා විශේෂ කරගන්න පු අපි පෙන්වන්නේ 6T+ පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ස්ථානය-of-the-art ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට සී<->en සහ නේ<->en සාමාන්\u200dය BLUE වල 1.2 වලින් සි සුන්ධ-ශෝට් ක්\u200dරිස්ටර් භාෂාවක් අභ්\u200dයාසනය කරන්න, ඒක 12.3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': "Qoraalkan wuxuu muujiyaa in qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan lagu soo daajiyo iyo habka farshaxanka kala duduwan labaduba ay muhiim u yihiin in lagu caawiyo wareejinta luqada kala duwan ee lagu soo wareejiyo zero-shot, meesha lagu imtixaamo muusikada tarjumaadka maskinada (NMT) oo lagu imtixaamo luuqadaha sourceed oo aan aqoonin xilliga waxbarashada la ilaaliyey. Fikiradan kadib waxaynu soo bandhignaa SixT+, model xoog badan oo af Ingiriis ah oo taageeraya 100 luuqadood ee asalka ah, laakiin waxaa lagu baraa macluumaad lambarka ah oo ku qoran lix luuqadood oo keliya. SixT+ SixT+ wuxuu sameynayaa bandhig wanaagsan oo ku qoran tarjumaadyo badan oo Ingiriis ah. Waxay si muhiim ah u muuqataa CRISS iyo m2m-100, laba nidaam oo xoog badan oo af luuqad kala duduwan, waxayna ku socotaa qiyaastii ugu badnaan 7,2 iyo 5,0 BLEU. Sidoo kale SixT+ Waxaan muujinnaa in ku daro SixT+ initialization outperforms state-of-the-art explicitly designed unsuperved NMT models on Si<->En and Ne<->En by over 1.2 average BLEU. Markii lagu codsado jimicsiga luqada nuurka ah, wuxuu soo saaraa faa'iido ku saabsan 12.3 ROUGE-L oo ku qoran mBART-ft. Waxaannu sameynaa baaritaano faa'iido ah si aan u garanayno macluumaadka muhiimka ah ee SixT+, kuwaas oo ah luuqadaha kala duduwan oo u eg macluumaadka, kooxda cayimanta ah, iyo baaritaanka luuqadaha kala duduwan.", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை காட்டுகிறது பல மொழி மொழி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் பல மொழிக்கு நன்றி மூடுதல் இருவரும் முக்கியமானது, சூழ்நிலை மொழிமாற்றம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் மாற்றுதலை  Following this idea, we present SixT+, a strong many-to-English NMT model that supports 100 source languages but is trained with a parallel dataset in only six source languages.  6 மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் ஆற்றல் T+ பெரும் செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது. அது CRISS மற்றும் m2m- 100 ஐ மேல் செயல்படுத்துகிறது, இரண்டு வலிமை பல மொழி NMT அமைப்புகள், சராசரியான அதிகாரம் 7. 2 மற்றும் 5. 0 பிலியுக்கும். கூடுதலாக, SixT+ ஒரு மாதிரி அளவுருக்களை வழங்குகிறது, அது மற்ற சேமிக்கப்படாத செயல்களுக்கு மேலும் நன்றாக முடியும். SixT+ துவக்கத்தை கூட்டுதல் வெளியில் செயல்படுத்துகிறது தெளிவாக வடிவமைக்கப்படாத NMT மாதிரிகளை சி <->En மற்றும் Ne <-> ஒரு 1. 2 க்கு மேல் 1. 2 சராசரி பிலியூயி பூஜ்ஜியம் சுழற்சி மொழி சுருக்கம் செயல்படுத்தலுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டால், அது சராசரியான செயல்பாடு வெளியிடுகிறது mBART- ft க்கு மேல் 12.3 ரூஜெட்-L. மேலும் முக்கிய மொழிகளை புரிந்து கொள்ள விவரமான ஆய்வுகளை செய்கிறது.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats visar att flerspråkig förberedelse och flerspråkig finjustering båda är avgörande för att underlätta tvärspråkig överföring i noll-shot översättning, där neural machine translation (NMT) modellen testas på källspråk som inte syns under övervakad utbildning. Efter denna idé presenterar vi SixT+, en stark många-till-engelska NMT-modell som stöder 100 källspråk men är utbildad med en parallell datauppsättning på endast sex källspråk. SixT+ initierar avkodarens inbäddning och full encoder med XLM-R large och tränar sedan encoder och dekoder lager med en enkel tvåstegs träningsstrategi. SixT+ uppnår imponerande prestanda på många-till-engelska översättningar. Den presterar betydligt bättre än CRISS och m2m-100, två starka flerspråkiga NMT-system, med en genomsnittlig vinst på 7,2 respektive 5,0 BLEU. Dessutom erbjuder SixT+ en uppsättning modellparametrar som kan justeras ytterligare till andra uppgifter som inte övervakas. Vi visar att tillägg av SixT+ initialisering överträffar state-of-the-art explicit utformade icke-övervakade NMT-modeller på Si<->En och Ne<->En med över 1,2 genomsnittlig BLEU. När den tillämpas på noll-skott tvärspråklig abstraktiv sammanfattning ger den en genomsnittlig prestandaökning på 12,3 ROUGE-L över mBART-ft. Vi genomför detaljerade analyser för att förstå nyckelkomponenterna i SixT+, inklusive flerspråkighet i hjälpparallella data, positionell avkopplad kodare och tvärspråklig överförbarhet av dess kodare.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ دکھاتا ہے کہ بہت سی زبان پرٹرین اور بہت سی زبان پرٹرین ٹونگ دونوں صفر-شٹ ترجمہ میں کرس-زبان ترجمہ کی آسانی کرنے کے لئے ضروری ہے جہاں نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) موڈل کی آزمائش کی جاتی ہے، جہاں نظارت کی تطارین کے وقت غیر اس ایڈیوں کے پیچھے ہم SixT+، ایک مضبوط انگلیسی NMT موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں جو 100 سورس زبانوں کی مدد کرتا ہے لیکن صرف چھ سورس زبانوں میں ایک parallel dataset کے ساتھ آموزش کی جاتی ہے. SixT+ ڈیکڈر ایمبڈینگ اور کامل انکوڈر کو XLM-R بزرگ کے ساتھ آغاز کرتا ہے اور پھر انکوڈر اور ڈیکڈر لائر کو ایک سادہ دو سٹیج ترین استراتژی کے ساتھ ترین کرتا ہے. SixT+ بہت سی انگلیسی ترجمہ پر اثر انگیزی فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے۔ یہ CRISS اور m2m-100، دو مضبوط ملتی زبان NMT سیستموں سے بہت زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، جس میں 7.2 اور 5.0 BLEU کے متوسط فائدہ ہے۔ اور اضافہ، چھٹی+ ایک مجموعہ موڈل پارامیٹروں کو پیش کرتا ہے جو دوسرے غیر پارکیٹ کے کاموں پر اضافہ ٹھیک ٹھیک کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ SixT+ پیدائش میں زیادہ اضافہ کرنا صریح طراحی کرتا ہے کہ 1.2 متوسط BLEU کے ذریعہ سے 1.2 سے زیادہ اضافہ نہیں کیا گیا NMT موڈل When applied to zero-shot cross-language abstractive summarization, it produces an average performance gain of 12.3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. We conduct detailed analyses to understand the key ingredients of SixT+, including multilinguality of the auxiliary parallel data, positional disentangled encoder, and the cross-lingual transferability of its encoder.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này chứng minh rằng việc sản xuất sản phẩm nhiều loại và chỉnh sửa nhiều loại đều rất quan trọng để dễ dàng chuyển sang ngôn ngữ khác nhau trong dịch bằng không, nơi mẫu dịch phiên dịch máy thần kinh (NMB) được thử trên ngôn ngữ nguồn không bị phát hiện khi được huấn luyện giám sát. Theo ý tưởng này, chúng tôi giới thiệu SixT+, một mô hình NMT đậm- sang-Anh hỗ trợ ngôn ngữ gốc 100, nhưng được huấn luyện với một dữ liệu song song tại chỉ sáu ngôn ngữ nguồn. SixT+ khởi động bộ mã mới và bộ mã hóa toàn bộ bằng cỡ XLM-R (XLM-R) và sau đó phát triển lớp mã hóa và bộ giải mã bằng một chiến lược huấn luyện hai cấp đơn giản. SixT+đạt được thành công ấn tượng trong dịch tiếng Anh nhiều. Nó vượt trội hơn CRAS và m2m-1000, hai hệ thống NMT đa dạng mạnh, với một lợi nhuận trung bình của mỗi 7.2 và 5.0 BleU. Thêm vào đó, Sikkim T+cung cấp một tập hợp các thông số mô hình có thể hoàn chỉnh thêm cho những nhiệm vụ không giám sát khác. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng việc thêm SixT+ khởi tạo thành hiện đại loại hoàn hảo được thiết kế không giám sát các mô hình NMT trên Si Tứ Tứ Tứ Tứ và Ne Tứ Tứ Tứ chi tiết một hơn cả l.2 trung bình... (Tiếng Nga) Khi được áp dụng cho việc tổng thể trừu tượng trừu tượng bằng lỗ không, nó sẽ tạo ra một tăng suất trung bình của 12', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz ko'pchilik tili tahrirlash va bir necha tillar o'zgarishni null- shoh tarjima tarjimasiga foydalanish uchun juda muhim. Bu yerda neyural maskin tarjima (NMT) modeli taʼminlovchi soʻzlarda mavjud emas. Bu g'oyani keyin biz SixT+ yordamida ko'p ingliz tiliga yordam beramiz, 100 manba tillarini qoʻllash mumkin, lekin faqat 6 manba tillarda parallel maʼlumotlar satri bilan o'rganamiz. SixT+ initializes the decoder embedding and the full encoder with XLM-R large and then trains the encoder and decoder layers with a simple two-stage training strategy.  Name Bu juda muhim CRISS va m2m- 100, ikki strong multili NMT tizimlarini boshlaydi, va 7.2 va 5.0 BLEU'ning o'rtacha ko'paytirish mumkin. Qoʻshimcha, SixT+ boshqa saqlanmagan vazifalarga qoʻshimcha moslamalar koʻrsatiladi. Biz SixT+ ishga tayyorlash holatini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. SixT va Ne <->1.2 dan ortiq bir darajada saqlangan NMT modellarini ko'rsatadi. Name", 'bg': 'Тази статия демонстрира, че многоезичното предобучение и многоезичното фино настройване са от решаващо значение за улесняване на междуезичния трансфер при нулев превод, където моделът на неврален машинен превод (НМТ) се тества на изходни езици, невиждани по време на обучение под надзор. Следвайки тази идея, ние представяме сигурен модел от много към английски език, който поддържа 100 езика източник, но е обучен с паралелен набор от данни само на шест езика източник. Инициализира вграждането на декодера и пълния кодер с голям и след това тренира слоевете на кодера и декодера с проста двустепенна стратегия за обучение. СиксТ+ постига впечатляващо представяне при превод от много на английски език. Той значително надминава две силни многоезични системи с средно увеличение съответно 7.2 и 5.0. Освен това предлага набор от параметри на модела, които могат да бъдат допълнително усъвършенствани към други задачи без надзор. Ние демонстрираме, че добавянето на инициализацията на SixT+ превъзхожда най-съвременните изрично проектирани без надзор модели на NMT на Si<->En и Ne<->En с над 1,2 средни BLEU. Когато се прилага при нулево междуезично абстрактивно обобщаване, то произвежда средно увеличение на производителността от 12.3 Извършваме подробни анализи, за да разберем ключовите съставки на Извършваме многоезичност на помощните паралелни данни, позиционен разкачен кодер и междуезичната преносимост на неговия кодер.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje da su multijezički pretvaranje i višejezički pretvaranje kritični za olakšanje preko jezika u prevodu nulog snimka, gdje se model prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) testira na izvornim jezicima koji se ne vidi tijekom nadzorne obuke. Nakon ove ideje, predstavljamo SixT+, jaki model na engleskom jeziku NMT koji podržava 100 izvorskih jezika, ali je obučen paralelnom setom podataka samo na šest izvorskih jezika. SixT+ inicijalizira ugrađenje dekodera i puni koder s velikim XLM-R, a zatim vježbaju slojeve kodera i dekodera jednostavnom strategijom treninga dva faza. SixT+ postiže impresivnu predstavu na prevodu mnogih do engleskog. To značajno iznosi CRISS i m2m-100, dvije snažne multijezičke NMT sustave s prosječnim dobitkom od 7,2 i 5,0 BLEU-a. Dodatno, SixT+ nudi skup modelnih parametara koji mogu biti dodatno ispravljeni drugim neodređenim zadatacima. Pokazujemo da dodavanje SixT+ inicijalizacije iznosi stanje umjetnosti jasno dizajnirane neodređene modele NMT na Si<->En i Ne<->En za preko 1,2 prosječne BLEU-e. Kada se primjenjuje na krstojezičku abstraktivnu sažetku nule snimke, proizvodi prosječni uspješni dobitak od 12,3 ROUGE-L iznad mBART-ft. Provodimo detaljne analize kako bi razumjeli ključne sastojke SixT+, uključujući višejezičnu sposobnost paralelnih podataka, pozicionalni disentacionalni koder i preko jezičke prijenosnosti svog kodera.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel toont aan dat meertalige pretraining en meertalige finetuning beide cruciaal zijn voor het faciliteren van cross-lingual transfer in zero-shot vertaling, waarbij het neurale machine translation (NMT) model wordt getest op brontalen die niet tijdens begeleide training worden gezien. Naar aanleiding van dit idee presenteren we SixT+, een sterk many-to-English NMT model dat 100-brontalen ondersteunt, maar is getraind met een parallelle dataset in slechts zes brontalen. SixT+ initialiseert de decoder embedding en de volledige encoder met XLM-R large en traint vervolgens de encoder en decoder lagen met een eenvoudige tweetraps trainingsstrategie. SixT+ levert indrukwekkende prestaties op veel-naar-Engels vertalingen. Het presteert aanzienlijk beter dan CRISS en m2m-100, twee sterke meertalige NMT-systemen, met een gemiddelde winst van respectievelijk 7.2 en 5.0 BLEU. Daarnaast biedt SixT+ een reeks modelparameters die verder kunnen worden afgestemd op andere taken zonder toezicht. We tonen aan dat het toevoegen van SixT+ initialisatie beter presteert dan state-of-the-art expliciet ontworpen NMT modellen zonder toezicht op Si<->En en Ne<->En met meer dan 1.2 gemiddelde BLEU. Wanneer toegepast op zero-shot cross-lingual abstractive summarization, produceert het een gemiddelde prestatiewinst van 12.3 ROUGE-L ten opzichte van mBART-ft. We voeren gedetailleerde analyses uit om de belangrijkste ingrediënten van SixT+ te begrijpen, waaronder meertaligheid van de hulpparallelle gegevens, positionele ontkoppelde encoder en de cross-lingual overdraagbaarheid van zijn encoder.', 'da': 'Denne artikel viser, at flersproget foruddannelse og flersproget finjustering begge er afgørende for at lette tværsproget overførsel i zero-shot oversættelse, hvor den neurale maskinoversættelsesmodel (NMT) testes på kildesprog, der ikke ses under overvåget træning. Efter denne idé præsenterer vi SixT+, en stærk mange-til-engelsk NMT model, der understøtter 100 kildesprog, men er uddannet med et parallelt datasæt på kun seks kildesprog. SixT+ initialiserer dekoder indlejring og fuld encoder med XLM-R large og træner derefter encoder og dekoder lag med en simpel to-trins træningsstrategi. SixT+ opnår imponerende ydeevne på mange-til-engelsk oversættelse. Det overgår betydeligt CRISS og m2m-100, to stærke flersprogede NMT systemer, med en gennemsnitlig gevinst på henholdsvis 7,2 og 5,0 BLEU. Derudover tilbyder SixT+ et sæt modelparametre, der yderligere kan finjusteres til andre opgaver uden opsyn. Vi demonstrerer, at tilføjelse af SixT+ initialisering overgår state-of-the-art eksplicit designede ikke-overvågede NMT modeller på Si<->En og Ne<->En med over 1,2 gennemsnitlige BLEU. Når det anvendes til nulskud tværsproget abstraktiv resuméering, producerer det en gennemsnitlig ydeevne gevinst på 12,3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. Vi gennemfører detaljerede analyser for at forstå de vigtigste ingredienser i SixT +, herunder flersprogethed af de ekstra parallelle data, positional disantangled encoder, og tværsproget overførbarhed af dens encoder.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit zeigt, dass mehrsprachiges Vortraining und mehrsprachige Feinabstimmung sowohl entscheidend für die Erleichterung des crosslingualen Transfers in der Zero-Shot-Übersetzung sind, wo das neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungsmodell (NMT) an Quellsprachen getestet wird, die während des überwachten Trainings nicht gesehen werden. Nach dieser Idee präsentieren wir SixT+, ein starkes Many-to-English NMT-Modell, das 100-Quellsprachen unterstützt, aber mit einem parallelen Datensatz in nur sechs Quellsprachen trainiert wird. SixT+ initialisiert die Decoder-Einbettung und den Full Encoder mit XLM-R large und trainiert dann die Encoder- und Decoder-Schichten mit einer einfachen zweistufigen Trainingsstrategie. SixT+ erzielt beeindruckende Leistung bei vielen ins Englische Übersetzungen. Es übertrifft deutlich CRISS und m2m-100, zwei starke mehrsprachige NMT-Systeme, mit einem durchschnittlichen Gewinn von 7.2 bzw. 5.0 BLEU. Zusätzlich bietet SixT+ eine Reihe von Modellparametern, die für andere Aufgaben ohne Aufsicht optimiert werden können. Wir zeigen, dass das Hinzufügen von SixT+-Initialisierung State-of-the-Art explizit entworfene unüberwachte NMT-Modelle auf Si<->En und Ne<->En um über 1,2 durchschnittliche BLEU übertrifft. Bei Anwendung auf Zero-Shot crosslingual abstractive Summaryzation ergibt es einen durchschnittlichen Leistungszuwachs von 12,3 ROUGE-L gegenüber mBART-ft. Wir führen detaillierte Analysen durch, um die wichtigsten Bestandteile von SixT+ zu verstehen, einschließlich Mehrsprachigkeit der Hilfsparallelen Daten, Positionsentkoppelter Encoder und die sprachliche Übertragbarkeit seines Encoders.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menunjukkan bahwa pretraining berbagai bahasa dan penyesuaian berbilang bahasa keduanya penting untuk memfasilitasi transfer saling bahasa dalam terjemahan nol, di mana model mesin saraf terjemahan (NMT) diuji pada bahasa sumber yang tidak terlihat selama latihan yang diawasi. Setelah ide ini, kami mempersembahkan SixT+, model NMT yang kuat dari banyak ke Inggris yang mendukung 100 bahasa sumber tetapi dilatih dengan set data paralel dalam hanya enam bahasa sumber. SixT+ initializes the decoder embedding and the full encoder with XLM-R large and then trains the encoder and decoder layers with a simple two-stage training strategy.  SixT+ achieves impressive performance on many-to-English translation.  Ini sangat melebihi CRISS dan m2m-100, dua sistem NMT berbagai bahasa yang kuat, dengan keuntungan rata-rata 7,2 dan 5,0 BLEU. Selain itu, SixT+ menawarkan set parameter model yang dapat ditetapkan lebih lanjut ke tugas lain yang tidak diawasi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa menambahkan SixT+ inisialisasi melampaui prestasi state-of-the-art secara eksplicit dirancang model NMT tidak diawasi di Si<->En dan Ne<->En dengan lebih dari 1,2 BLEU rata-rata. Ketika diaplikasikan pada penelitian abstraktif saling bahasa 0-shot, itu menghasilkan keuntungan prestasi rata-rata 12,3 ROUGE-L di atas mBART-ft. Kami melakukan analisis terperinci untuk memahami bahan kunci SixT+, termasuk multibahasa dari data paralel bantuan, pengekode positional disentangled, dan transferabilitas saling bahasa pengekodinya.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha kuwa mvua ya lugha mbalimbali na mafunzo ya vizuri ya lugha mbalimbali ni muhimu kwa ajili ya kusaidia usafirishaji wa lugha katika tafsiri isiyo na sifa, ambapo mtindo wa kutafsiri mashine ya kijamii (NMT) unajaribiwa kwa lugha za asili zisizo na mafunzo yanayofuatiliwa. Kufuatia wazo hili, tunawasilisha SixT+, modeli yenye nguvu ya NMT yenye asili ya Kiingereza inayounga mkono lugha 100 za asili lakini inafundishwa na taarifa zilizofanana kwa lugha sita tu. SixT+ inaanzisha kodi inayoingizwa na kodi kamili yenye XLM-R kubwa na kisha kufundisha vipande vya kodi na kupunguza vifaa vya mafunzo kwa mkakati rahisi wa jukwaa mbili. SixT+ inafanikiwa utendaji mzuri wa tafsiri nyingi kwa lugha ya Kiingereza. Inaonyesha kwa kiasi kikubwa CRISS na m2m-100, mifumo miwili yenye nguvu ya lugha mbalimbali, yenye ongezeko la wastani kwa asilimia 7.2 na 5.0 BLEU. Kwa nyongeza, SixT+ anatoa mfululizo wa vipimo vya model ambavyo vinaweza kuwa na vizuri zaidi kwa kazi nyingine zisizo hifadhiwa. Tunaonyesha kwamba kuongeza mwanzo wa SixT+ unaendesha hali ya-sanaa zilizotengenezwa kwa uwazi wa mifano ya NMT isiyo na uhakika katika Si<->En na Ne<->En na zaidi ya wastani wa 1.2 BLEU. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa kina ili kuelewa viungo muhimu vya SixT+, ikiwa ni pamoja na uwezekano wa takwimu mbalimbali, utaratibu wa kiwango cha wastani wa ufanisi wa wastani wa wastani wa 12.3 ROUGE-L kwa kiasi cha mBART-ft.', 'ko': '본고는 제로 렌즈 번역에서 다중 언어의 예비 훈련과 다중 언어의 미조정은 다중 언어의 이동을 추진하는 데 매우 중요하다는 것을 증명한다. 신경기계번역(NMT)모델은 감독 훈련 과정에서 관찰하지 못한 원시 언어에 대해 테스트를 실시한다.이 아이디어에 따라 우리는 식스T+를 제기했다. 이것은 강력한 다중 영어 NMT 모델로 100가지 원시 언어를 지원하지만 6가지 원시 언어의 병행 데이터 집합만 사용하여 훈련한다.SixT+는 XLM-R large를 사용하여 디코더 삽입과 전체 인코더를 초기화한 다음 간단한 2단계 훈련 전략으로 인코더와 디코더 층을 훈련합니다.식스T+는 많은 영어 번역 분야에서 인상적인 성적을 거두었다.그것의 성능은 CRIS와 m2m-100 두 강력한 다국어 NMT 시스템보다 현저히 우수하며 평균 이득은 각각 7.2와 5.0 BLEU이다.또한 SixT+는 모델 매개변수 세트를 제공하여 감독되지 않는 다른 작업에 맞게 더 미세하게 조정할 수 있습니다.우리는 Si<->En과 Ne<->En에 식스T+ 초기화를 추가하는 것이 가장 선진적인 현식 디자인의 무감독 NMT 모델의 평균 BLEU보다 1.2 이상 높다는 것을 증명했다.제로 렌즈 크로스 언어 추상적 요약에 적용될 때, 평균 성능의 이득은 12.3 ROUGE-L로 mBART-ft보다 높다. 식스T+의 관건적인 구성 부분인 보조 병행 데이터의 다중 언어성, 위치 분리 인코더와 인코더의 크로스 언어 이동성을 포함하여 상세하게 분석했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ نشان می\u200cدهد که تغییرات زیادی زبان و تنظیم زیادی زبان هر دو برای تغییرات زیادی زبان در ترجمه\u200cهای صفر تصاویر است، جایی که مدل ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) بر زبانهای منبع بی\u200cنظیر در زمان تمرین نظارت آزمایش می\u200cشود. بعد از این ایده، ما SixT+، یک مدل NMT بسیار قوی به انگلیسی را نشان می دهیم که ۱۰۰ زبان منبع را حمایت می کند ولی با یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای parallel در تنها شش زبان منبع آموزش می\u200cکند. شش\u200cتی+، آغاز می\u200cکند که تغییر\u200cبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی دکوردر و رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی کامل با بزرگ XLM-R و سپس لایه\u200cهای رمز\u200cکننده و دکوردر را با استراتژی\u200cهای آموزش دو مرحله ساده تمرین می\u200cکند. شش\u200cتی+، اجرای تحت تاثیرگذاری بر ترجمه\u200cهای بسیاری به انگلیسی می\u200cرسد. آن به طور معنی CRISS و m2m-100، دو سیستم NMT متعدد زبان قوی با یک سود متوسط از 7.2 و 5.0 بلوئ بالاتر است. علاوه بر این، SixT+ یک مجموعه از پارامترهای مدل را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که می\u200cتواند به کارهای دیگر غیرقابل تحویل داده شود. ما نشان می دهیم که اضافه کردن شروع شش\u200cت+، بیشتر از ۱.۲ متوسط BLEU از مدل\u200cهای NMT غیرقابل توصیف شده\u200cاست. هنگامی که برای تعداد زیادی از زبان\u200cهای مختلف صفر استفاده می\u200cشود، آن یک سود عملکرد متوسط از 12.3 ROUGE-L بر mBART-ft تولید می\u200cکند. ما تحلیل\u200cهای جزئیات را انجام می\u200cدهیم تا مواد کلید SixT+، شامل تعداد زیادی زبان\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متوسط، رمزبان\u200cهای موقعیت متوسط و قابلیت متوسط زبان\u200cهای رمزگارش را درک کنیم.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz birnäçe dilli baglanyş we birnäçe dilli baglanyş hem dilli baglanyş hem zero-at terjimesinde, niral maşynyň terjimesiniň (NMT) modeliniň gözlemýän bilim durynda görnülmeýän çeşme dillerinde barlanýandygyny görkezýär. Bu ideýadan soňra SixT+'i görkezip, 100 çeşme dilini destekleýän güýçli iňlisçe NMT nusgasyna görkezip, ýöne diňe 6 çeşme dilinde parallel veri setigi bilen eğitilýär. SixT+ ködleme gapysyny we doly kodeýäni XLM-R uly bilen başlaýar we soňra kodeýäni we kodeýäni basit iki stadij eğim stratejisi bilen okaýar. SixT+ Iňlisçe-den köp terjime etmäne täsirli zady ýetip bilýär. Bu CRISS we m2m-100, iki güýçli multi dilli NMT sistemlerinden üstün tutar. Diňe 7.2 we 5.0 BLEU arasynda ortalama gazanýar. Ayrıca SixT+ başga gaýd edilmedik zada düzelebilecek modelleri teklif edir. Biz SixT+ başlangıç eklemek sanatyň durumyny Si<->En we Ne<->En üstünde 1,2 orta BLEU'da tasarruf edilmedigini kanıtlaýarys. 0.3 ROUGE-L'i mBART-ft üzerinden ortalama çözümleme uygulandığında, 6T+'un aç maddelerini anlamak için detaylar analizi yaptık, yardımcı paralel verilerin çoklu dillerinde, pozisyonal kaynaklanmış kodlayıcının ve onun kodlayıcısının çoklu dillerinde taşınabilirliği yapar.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument demonstron se paratrajtimi shumëgjuhës dhe rregullimi shumëgjuhës janë të dy kritikë për lehtësimin e transferimit ndërgjuhësor në përkthimin zero-shot, ku modeli i përkthimit nervor të makinave (NMT) testohet në gjuhët burimore të padukshme gjatë trajnimit të mbikqyrur. Pas kësaj ide, ne paraqesim SixT+, një model i fortë NMT shumë-në-anglisht që mbështet 100 gjuhë burimi por është trajnuar me një set të dhënash paralele në vetëm gjashtë gjuhë burimi. SixT+ inicializon integrimin e dekoderit dhe koduesin e plotë me XLM-R të madh dhe pastaj trajnon shtresa të koduesit dhe dekoderit me një strategji të thjeshtë treinimi në dy faza. SixT+ arrin shfaqje mbresëlënëse në përkthimin shumë-në-anglisht. Ajo tejkalon në mënyrë të konsiderueshme CRISS dhe m2m-100, dy sisteme të fuqishme shumëgjuhësore NMT, me një fitim mesatar respektivisht 7.2 dhe 5.0 BLEU. Përveç kësaj, SixT+ ofron një sërë parametrash modeli që mund të rregullohen më tej me detyra të tjera të pazgjidhura. Ne demonstrojmë se shtimi i inicializimit të SixT+ përfshin modelet e NMT të projektuara eksplicitarisht në Si<->En dhe Ne<->En me më shumë se 1.2 mesatare BLEU. Kur aplikohet në përmbledhjen abstrakte ndërgjuhësore zero-shot, ajo prodhon një fitim mesatar performance prej 12.3 ROUGE-L mbi mBART-ft. Ne kryejmë analiza të hollësishme për të kuptuar përbërësit kryesorë të SixT+, duke përfshirë shumëgjuhësinë e të dhënave paralele ndihmuese, koduesin pozitiv të zhvendosur dhe transferuesin ndërgjuhësor të koduesit të saj.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች መፍጠር እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች መፍጠር በzero-shot ትርጓሜ ለማግኘት የግል ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ይህንን አሳብ በተከተለ፣ ስድስቲ+ በመጀመሪያ ቋንቋዎች ግን በስድስት ቋንቋ ብቻ በተለየ የዳታተር ጽሑፍ የተጠቃሚ የንግግሊዘኛ NMT ሞዴል እናቀርባለን፡፡ ስድስት ስድስት በተለየ CRISS እና m2m-100፣ ሁለት ብርቱ የልዩ ቋንቋዎች የNMT ስርዓቶች በተለየ 7.2 እና 5.0 ቢልዩን ያበዛል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ስድስት+ የሞዴል parameters ለሌሎች ያልጠበቀው ስራዎች እንዲጠቀሙ ይችላል። We demonstrate that adding SixT+ initialization outperforms state-of-the-art explicitly designed unsupervised NMT models on Si<->En and Ne<->En by over 1.2 average BLEU.  በ0.3 የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ አቋራጭ ላይ በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ የ12.3 ሮዑGE-L በmBART-ft ላይ ጥቅም ያቀርባል። የስድስት+ መክፈቻዎቹን ለማስተዋል እናስተዋልታለን። የስድስት ግንኙነት እና የአካባቢ ዳታዎችን፣ የስህተት ግንኙነትን እና የቋንቋ ክፍል ማቀናጃ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier bevestig dat multilinglike pretreëning en multilinglike fintuning is beide kritiese vir die gemeenskap van kruistale oordrag in nulskoot vertaling, waar die neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) model is testeer op bron tale wat onbevestig word gedurende ondersoek onderwerp. Volgens hierdie idee, stel ons SixT+, 'n sterk baie na-Engels NMT model wat 100 bron tale ondersteun, maar is opgelei met 'n parallele datastel in slegs ses bron tale. Name Name Dit uitvoer betekenlik CRISS en m2m-100, twee sterk multilinglike NMT-stelsels, met 'n gemiddelde verskaf van 7.2 en 5.0 BLEU respectively. Additionally, SixT+ offers a set of model parameters that can be further fine-tuned to other unsupported tasks. Ons wys dat by die byvoeg van SixT+ inisialisering uitvoer die state-of-the-art explicitly ontwerp nie onderwerpende NMT modele op Si < ->En en Ne < ->En deur meer 1.2 gemiddelde BLEU. Wanneer gebruik word na nul-skoot kruis-tale abstraktiewe opsomming, maak dit 'n gemiddelde prestasie versterking van 12.3 ROUGE-L oor mBART-ft. Ons doen gedetale analiserings om die sleutel ingredients van SixT+teverstaan, insluitend veelvuldige talelyheid van die helplike parallele data, posisieal ontsonderde enkoder en die kruis-tale oordragbaarheid van sy enkoder.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ցույց է տալիս, որ բազմալեզու նախադասությունը և բազմալեզու բարելավումը կարևոր են լեզվի միջև փոխանցվող փոխանցումը հասարակ թարգմանության մեջ, որտեղ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդելը փորձարկում է նախագծված լեզուների վրա, որոնք Այս գաղափարի հետևանքով մենք ներկայացնում ենք SixT+, մի ուժեղ շատ-անգլերեն NMT մոդել, որը աջակցում է 100 աղբյուր լեզուներ, սակայն ուսուցանում է զուգահեռ տվյալների համակարգով միայն վեց աղբյուր լեզուներում: SixT+ initializes the decoder embedding and the full encoder with XLM-R large and then trains the encoder and decoder layers with a simple two-stage training strategy.  SixT+ ունի տպավորիչ արտադրություն շատ անգլերեն թարգմանություններում: Այն նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է Քրիսսին և m2m-100-ին, երկու ուժեղ բազլեզու ՆՄԹ համակարգերին, որոնց միջին շահույթը 7.2 և 5.0 է, համեմատաբար, ԲԼԵՎ: Additionally, SixT+ offers a set of model parameters that can be further fine-tuned to other unsupervised tasks.  We demonstrate that adding SixT+ initialization outperforms state-of-the-art explicitly designed unsupervised NMT models on Si<->En and Ne<->En by over 1.2 average BLEU.  Երբ կիրառվում է զրոյական խաչված լեզվի վերացական համառոտագրության վրա, այն արտադրում է 12.3 ROUGe-L արտադրողականության միջին բարձրացում mBAR-ոտքի հարաբերությամբ, մենք կատարում ենք մանրամասն վերլուծություններ SixT+-ի կարևոր բաղադրիչները հասկանալու համար, ներառյալ օգնական զուգահեռ տվյալների բազլեզվությունը, դիրքումը բացարձակ', 'bn': 'This paper demonstrates that multilingual pretraining and multilingual fine-tuning are both critical for facilitating cross-lingual transfer in zero-shot translation, where the neural machine translation (NMT) model is tested on source languages unseen during supervised training.  এই চিন্তার অনুসারে, আমরা সিক্স টি+ উপস্থাপন করছি একটি শক্তিশালী অনেক-থেকে ইংরেজী এনএমটি মডেল যা ১০০ সোর্স ভাষাকে সমর্থন করে কিন্তু শুধুম সিক্স টি+ ডেকোডার এমপেডিং এবং XLM-R বিশাল এনকোডারের পূর্ণ এনকোডার শুরু করে এবং তারপর এনকোডার এবং ডিকোডারের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ করে দুই স্ অনেক-থেকে ইংরেজি অনুবাদের বিষয়ে ছক্স টি+ আকর্ষণীয় প্রদর্শন অর্জন করেছে। এটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সিরিআইএস এবং এম২ মিটার-১০০, দুটি শক্তিশালী বহুভাষী এনএমটি সিস্টেম প্রদর্শন করে, যার মধ্যে সাধারণত ৭. ২ এবং ৫. এছাড়াও, সিক্স টি+ একটি মোডেল প্যারামিটার প্রদান করেছে যা অন্যান্য অরক্ষিত কাজের জন্য আরো ভালো সংরক্ষিত হতে পারে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সিক্স টি+ প্রাথমিকভাবে যোগ করা হচ্ছে যে শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের পরিস্কারভাবে পরিকল্পনা করা অরক্ষিত NMT মডেল সিই <->এন এবং নি <->এন ১ শূন্য-শুট ক্রিভাষার সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত ক্ষেত্রে প্রযোজ্য হলে এটি মিবার্ট-ফটের উপর গড় প্রভাব ১২.', 'az': "Bu kağıt göstərir ki, çoxlu dil təkrarlama və çoxlu dil təkrarlama hər ikisi sıfır təkrarlama içində çoxlu təkrarlama və nöral maşın təkrarlaması (NMT) model in in gözlənmiş təkrarlama sırasında görmədikləri mənbə dillərində imtahana çəkilir. Bu ideyadan sonra SixT+, 100 mənbə dillərini dəstəkləyib, ancaq altı mənbə dillərində paralel veri seti ilə təhsil edilir. SixT+ kodlayıcını və bütün kodlayıcını XLM-R ilə başlatır və sonra kodlayıcı və kodlayıcı düzümləri basit iki fərdə təhsil strateji ilə təhsil edir. SixT+ çoxlu İngilizə çevirilməsində təsirli performansı başa çatdı. Bu CRISS və m2m-100, iki güclü çox dilli NMT sistemində ortalama 7.2 və 5.0 BLEU artıqlığı ilə çox üstün olur. Üstəlik, SixT+ başqa qeydə edilməmiş işlərə daha yaxşı düzəltə biləcək modellər parametroları təklif edir. Biz SixT+ başlanğıçlığı toplamağı Si < ->En və Ne < ->En üstündə 1,2 orta BLEU ilə müəyyən edilməmiş NMT modellərini açıq-aydın tasarladığını göstəririk. Sıfır-atlı çox dilli abstraktiv təmizlənməyə uyğun zaman, o, mBART-ft üstündə 12.3 ROUGE-L'in ortalama təmizlənməsini yaradır. Biz SixT+'in anahtar maddelerini anlamaq üçün detaylı analizi çəkirik, kömək paralel məlumatların çoxlu dillərində, pozisyon çəkilmiş kodlayıcının çoxlu kodlayıcı və kodlayıcının çoxlu dillərin təmizlənməsini də dahil edərik.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir pokazuje da su multijezički pretvaranje i višejezički pretvaranje kritični za olakšanje preko jezika u prevodu nulog snimka, gdje se model prevoda neuralne mašine (NMT) testira na izvornim jezicima koji se ne vidi tijekom nadzorne obuke. Nakon ove ideje predstavljamo SixT+, jaki model na engleskom jeziku NMT koji podržava 100 izvorskih jezika, ali je obučen paralelnom setom podataka samo na šest izvorskih jezika. SixT+ inicijalizira ugrađenje dekodera i puni koder sa velikim XLM-R, a zatim trenira slojeve kodera i dekodera jednostavnom strategijom treninga u dvofazi. SixT+ postiže impresivno predstavljanje mnogih na engleskom prevodu. To značajno iznosi CRISS i m2m-100, dvije jake multijezičke NMT sustave, s prosječnim dobitkom od 7,2 i 5,0 BLEU-a. Dodatno, SixT+ nudi skup modelnih parametara koji mogu biti dodatno ispravljeni drugim neodređenim zadacima. Pokazujemo da dodavanje SixT+ inicijalizacije iznosi state-of-the-art izravno dizajnirane neodređene modele NMT na Si<->En i Ne<->En za preko 1,2 prosječne BLEU. Kada se primjenjuje na krstojezičku abstraktivnu sažetku nule snimke, proizvodi prosječni uspješni dobitak od 12,3 ROUGE-L iznad mBART-ft. Provodimo detaljne analize kako bi razumjeli ključne sastojke SixT+, uključujući multijezičnost pomoćnih paralelnih podataka, pozicionalni disentacionalni koder i preko jezičke transferabilnosti svog kodera.', 'ca': "Aquest paper demostra que la pré-capacitació multilingüe i l'ajustament multilingüe són ambdós crítics per facilitar la transfer ència translingüe en traducció de fotografies zero, on el model de traducció neural de màquines (NMT) es prova en llengües fonts que no es veuen durant l'entrenament supervisat. Following this idea, we present SixT+, a strong many-to-English NMT model that supports 100 source languages but is trained with a parallel dataset in only six source languages.  SixT+ initializes the decoder embedding and the full encoder with XLM-R large and then trains the encoder and decoder layers with a simple two-stage training strategy.  SixT+ aconsegueix un rendiment impressionant en la traducció de molts a anglès. Supera significativament el CRISS i el m2m-100, dos sistemes multillengües de NMT forts, amb un guany mitjà de 7,2 i 5,0 BLEU respectivament. Additionally, SixT+ offers a set of model parameters that can be further fine-tuned to other unsupervised tasks.  We demonstrate that adding SixT+ initialization outperforms state-of-the-art explicitly designed unsupervised NMT models on Si<->En and Ne<->En by over 1.2 average BLEU.  Quan s'aplica a una resumensió abstracta translingüística de fotografia zero, produeix un guany mitjà de rendiment de 12,3 ROUGE-L sobre mBART-ft. Fem an àlisis detallats per entendre els ingredients clau de SixT+, incloent la multilingüalitat de les dades paralleles auxiliars, el codificador desorientat de posició i la transferibilitat translingüística del codificador.", 'cs': 'Tento článek ukazuje, že vícejazyčný předškolení a vícejazyčné jemné ladění jsou klíčové pro usnadnění přenosu mezi jazyky v nulovém překladu, kde je model neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) testován na zdrojových jazycích neviditelných během dohledu. Na základě této myšlenky představujeme SixT+, silný mnoho-do-anglický NMT model, který podporuje 100 zdrojové jazyky, ale je trénován s paralelní datovou sadou pouze v šesti zdrojových jazycích. SixT+ inicializuje vložení dekodéru a plný snímač s XLM-R large a pak trénuje vrstvy snímače a dekodéru pomocí jednoduché dvoustupňové tréninkové strategie. SixT+ dosahuje působivého výkonu při překladu z mnoha do angličtiny. Výrazně překonává CRISS a m2m-100, dva silné vícejazyčné NMT systémy, s průměrným ziskem 7.2 a 5.0 BLEU. SixT+ navíc nabízí sadu parametrů modelu, které lze dále doladit na další úlohy bez dohledu. Ukázali jsme, že přidání inicializace SixT+ překonává nejmodernější explicitně navržené NMT modely na Si<->En a Ne<->En o průměrnou BLEU více než 1,2. Při aplikaci na zero-shot cross-jazyčné abstraktivní shrnutí dochází k průměrnému zisku výkonu 12.3 ROUGE-L oproti mBART-ft. Provádíme detailní analýzy, abychom porozuměli klíčovým složkám SixT+, včetně mnohojazyčnosti pomocných paralelních dat, polohově odzaměřeného snímače a přenositelnosti jeho snímače v různých jazycích.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli osoittaa, että monikielinen esikoulutus ja monikielinen hienosäätö ovat sekä kriittisiä monikielisen siirron helpottamiseksi nollakäännöksessä, jossa neurokonekäännösmallia (NMT) testataan lähdekielillä, joita ei ole nähty valvotun koulutuksen aikana. Tämän idean pohjalta esittelemme SixT+, vahvan monikielisen NMT-mallin, joka tukee 100 lähdekieltä mutta joka on koulutettu rinnakkaisella aineistolla vain kuudella lähdekielellä. SixT+ alustaa dekooderiupotuksen ja täyden kooderin XLM-R large -toiminnolla ja kouluttaa sitten kooderi- ja dekooderitasoja yksinkertaisella kaksivaiheisella harjoitusstrategialla. SixT+:lla on vaikuttava suorituskyky monikielisessä käännöksessä. Se on huomattavasti parempi kuin CRISS ja m2m-100, kaksi vahvaa monikielistä NMT-järjestelmää, keskimäärin 7,2 ja 5,0 BLEU. Lisäksi SixT+ tarjoaa joukon malliparametreja, joita voidaan hienosäätää muihin valvomattomiin tehtäviin. Osoitamme, että SixT+-alustuksen lisääminen ylittää huippuluokan nimenomaisesti suunnitellut valvomattomat NMT-mallit Si<->En- ja Ne<->En-malleissa yli 1,2 keskimääräisellä BLEU:lla. Kun sitä käytetään nollakuvan monikieliseen abstraktiiviseen yhteenvedoon, se tuottaa keskimääräisen suorituskyvyn 12,3 ROUGE-L:n nousun mBART-ft:ään verrattuna. Teemme yksityiskohtaisia analyysejä ymmärtääksemme SixT+:n keskeisiä ainesosia, kuten rinnakkaisaineiston monikielisyyttä, paikannuksen irrotettua enkooderia ja sen enkooderin monikielisyyttä.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö näitab, et mitmekeelne koolitus ja mitmekeelne peenhäälestus on mõlemad kriitilised keeltevahelise ülekande hõlbustamiseks nullkatse tõlke puhul, kus närvilise masintõlke mudelit testitakse lähtekeeltes, mida järelevalve käigus ei ole nähtud. Selle idee põhjal tutvustame SixT+, tugevat mitmekeelset NMT mudelit, mis toetab 100 lähtekeelt, kuid mida koolitatakse paralleelse andmekogumiga vaid kuues lähtekeeles. SixT+ initsialiseerib dekooderi manustamise ja täiskooderi XLM-R suure abil ning seejärel treenib kodeeri ja dekooderi kihte lihtsa kaheastmelise treeningstrateegia abil. SixT+ saavutab muljetavaldava jõudluse paljude inglise keelde tõlkimisel. See ületab märkimisväärselt CRISS ja m2m-100, kaks tugevat mitmekeelset NMT süsteemi, keskmise kasu vastavalt 7,2 ja 5,0 BLEU. Lisaks pakub SixT+ mudeliparameetrite komplekti, mida saab täiendavalt täpsustada muude järelevalveta ülesannetega. Näitame, et SixT+ initsialiseerimise lisamine ületab tipptasemel sõnaselgelt kavandatud järelevalveta NMT mudelite Si<->En ja Ne<->En puhul üle 1,2 keskmise BLEU võrra. Kui seda rakendatakse nullkeelsele abstraktiivsele kokkuvõttele, annab see keskmise jõudluse suurenemise 12,3 ROUGE-L võrreldes mBART-ft-ga. Me teeme üksikasjalikke analüüse, et mõista SixT+ põhikomponente, sealhulgas paralleelsete lisaandmete mitmekeelsust, positsioonist lahutatud kodeerijat ja selle kodeerija keeleülest ülekantavust.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek dokazuje, da sta večjezično predusposabljanje in večjezično fino nastavitev ključnega pomena za olajšanje medjezičnega prenosa pri ničelnem prevajanju, kjer se model nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) testira na izvornih jezikih, ki niso bili vidni med nadzorovanim usposabljanjem. Na podlagi te ideje predstavljamo SixT+, močan model NMT, ki podpira 100 izvornih jezikov, vendar je usposobljen z vzporednim naborom podatkov v samo šestih izvornih jezikih. SixT+ inicializira vgradnjo dekoderja in celoten kodirnik z XLM-R velikim, nato pa izvaja plasti kodirnika in dekoderja s preprosto dvostopenjsko strategijo usposabljanja. SixT+ dosega impresivno zmogljivost pri prevajanju mnogih v angleščino. Znatno presega CRISS in m2m-100, dva močna večjezična NMT sistema, s povprečnim pridobivanjem 7,2 oziroma 5,0 BLEU. Poleg tega SixT+ ponuja nabor parametrov modela, ki jih je mogoče dodatno prilagoditi drugim nenadzorovanim opravilom. Dokazujemo, da dodajanje inicializacije SixT+ presega najsodobnejše eksplicitno oblikovane neonadzorovane NMT modele na Si<->En in Ne<->En za več kot 1,2 povprečnega BLEU. Ko se uporablja za ničelno medjezično abstraktivno povzetek, doseže povprečno povečanje zmogljivosti 12,3 ROUGE-L v primerjavi z mBART-ft. Izvajamo podrobne analize za razumevanje ključnih sestavin SixT+, vključno z večjezičnostjo pomožnih vzporednih podatkov, pozicijskim razvezanim kodirnikom in medjezično prenosljivostjo kodirnika.', 'jv': 'Awak iki diputara karo akeh langkung sampeyan karo akeh operasi luwih akeh pisan lan akeh langkung sampeyan kuwi nggawe barang nggawe gerakan bantuan karo ingkang nul-uput, supoya sistem itolet karo netwasan (NMT) Awakdhéwé nggunakake iki, kéné gunakake 6 T+, model sing luwih-luwih kanggo ingkang NMT supoyo barang tarjamahan kanggo ngerasakno karo perusahaan dataset karo perusahaan kanggo sesuk kelas. Sistem ono dihayo perusahaan koder nggawe lan akeh koder komplit kanggo kelas XLM-R dumadhi lan tho nggawe koder lan dekorahaan layers karo perusahaan sistem duwe stadigor. Language Punika dipoleh langkung wigatasar kreIsS karo m2m-10, sistem NMT sing titig bantêr kanggo langgar sapa kut sawar 7.2 lan 5.0 B. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno nung nambah 6 T+, dadi-kalem sing bisa perusahaan maneh dumateng NMT seneng Suit <->eneh lan ne<->eneh seneng sampek 1.2 sampek blek Wang mi nggunakake nul-shot karo akeh luwih-luwih resumen, dadi nggawe nyimpen langgar pada 12.3', 'ha': "@ info Ga bayan wannan zato, Munã halatar da SixT+, wata misãli mai ƙarfi zuwa-Ingiriya mai ƙarfi na NMT mai ƙarfafa lugha 100 masu ƙaranci amma an sanar da wani danne masu daidaita cikin harshen sita kawai. Six @ item Spelling dictionary Ina iya ƙaranci CRIS da m2m-100, ma'anar mutilari biyu mai ƙarfi na NMT, da an ƙara tsakanin kashi game da henhold 7.2 da 5.0 BLEU. Ƙara, SixT+ yana da wani tsari na motsi da za'a iya samar da shi zuwa wasu aikin da ba'a tsare ba. Tuna nuna cewa, a ƙara SixT+ faratarwa na performs state-of-the-art an bayyane designed non-uptsared NMT motolin sa >One and Ne <->One da ke ƙaranci 1.2 mai ƙidãya BLEU. When applied to zero-shot cross-lingual abstractive summarization, it produces an average performance gain of 12.3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. We conduct detailed analyses to understand the key ingredients of SixT+, including multilinguality of the auxiliary parallel data, positional disentangled encoder, and the cross-lingual transferability of its encoder.", 'he': 'This paper demonstrates that multilingual pretraining and multilingual fine-tuning are both critical for facilitating cross-lingual transfer in zero-shot translation, where the neural machine translation (NMT) model is tested on source languages unseen during supervised training.  בעקבות הרעיון הזה, אנחנו מציגים SixT+, מודל NMT חזק הרבה לאנגלית שתומך 100 שפות מקור אבל מאומנים עם קבוצת נתונים מקבילה בשש שפות מקור בלבד. שש טי+ מתחיל את התקיפה של התקיפה והקודד המלא עם XLM-R גדול ואז מאמן את הקודד והקודד שכבות עם אסטרטגיה פשוט של אימון בשתי שלבים. שש טי+ משיגים ביצועים מרשים על תרגום רבים לאנגלית. הוא יוצא משמעותית מעל CRISS ו-m2m-100, שתי מערכות NMT רבות שפות חזקות, עם רווח ממוצע של 7.2 ו-5.0 BLEU בהתאם. בנוסף, SixT+ מציע קבוצה של פרמטרים דוגמנים שיכולים להתאים יותר למשימות לא משומרות אחרות. אנו מראים שההוספת התחלה של SixT+ תובילה מודלים NMT לא מעוצבים באופן ברור על סי<->En ו Ne<->En על ידי יותר מ 1.2 BLEU ממוצע. כאשר הופעלה לסומריזציה אוסטרקטיבית בין שפתיים ללא יריות, היא יוצרת רווח ביצוע ממוצע של 12.3 ROUGE-L מעל mBART-ft. אנו מבצעים ניתוחים מפורטים כדי להבין את המרכיבים המרכזים של SixT+, כולל רבות שפתיים של נתונים מקבילים עזריים, קודד מקומי מחוסר, והעברה בין שפתיים של הקודן שלה.', 'bo': 'This paper demonstrates that multilingual pretraining and multilingual fine-tuning are both critical for facilitating cross-lingual transfer in zero-shot translation, where the neural machine translation (NMT) model is tested on source languages unseen during supervised training. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤུགས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ SixT+, གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བརྡན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཨིན་ཇིའི་NMT རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་༡༠༠ལ་རྒྱ SixT+ initializes the decoder embedding and the full encoder with XLM-R large and then trains the encoder and decoder layers with a simple two-stage training strategy. 6T+ ཡིས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་འཕར་རིས་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་CRISS དང་m2m-100 ། སྐད་ཡིག་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་ཙམ་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མང་ཤོས་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། དེ་ནི་སྐྱེས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉིད་གཉིས་ཀྱི Additionally, SixT+ offers a set of model parameters that can be further fine-tuned to other unsupervised tasks. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་འགོ་སློང་ཆེན་པ་+ ལས་འཕགས་རིས་བཀོད་བྱས་ན། འདི་སི་<->ཨིན་དང་ནི་<->གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཆེན་པོའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཉེས་མཁན་ When applied to zero-shot cross-lingual abstractive summarization, it produces an average performance gain of 12.3 ROUGE-L over mBART-ft. We conduct detailed analyses to understand the key ingredients of SixT+, including multilinguality of the auxiliary parallel data, positional disentangled encoder, and the cross-lingual transferability of its encoder.'}
{'en': 'HiTab A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'ar': 'TopWORDS-Seg: تجزئة النص في وقت واحد واكتشاف الكلمات للنصوص الصينية ذات المجال المفتوح عبر الاستدلال البايزي', 'es': 'Topwords-SEG: Segmentación de texto y descubrimiento de palabras simultáneos para textos chinos de dominio abierto mediante inferencia bayesiana', 'pt': 'TopWORDS-Seg: segmentação simultânea de texto e descoberta de palavras para textos chineses de domínio aberto via inferência bayesiana', 'fr': "TopWords-SEG\xa0: Segmentation de texte simultanée et découverte de mots pour les textes chinois de domaine ouvert via l'inférence bayésienne", 'ja': 'TopWORDS - Seg ：ベイズ推論によるオープンドメインの中国語テキストの同時テキストセグメンテーションと単語検出', 'ru': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Синхронная сегментация текста и открытие слов для открытых китайских текстов через байесовский вывод', 'hi': 'TopWORDS-Seg: बायेसियन अनुमान के माध्यम से ओपन-डोमेन चीनी ग्रंथों के लिए एक साथ पाठ विभाजन और वर्ड डिस्कवरी', 'zh': 'TopWORDS-Seg曰:贝叶斯推而开之,分单词也', 'ga': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Deighilt Téacs Comhuaineach agus Fionnachtain Focal le haghaidh Téacsanna Síneacha Fearainn Oscailte trí Tátal Bayesian', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ταυτόχρονη τμηματοποίηση κειμένου και ανακάλυψη λέξεων για κινεζικά κείμενα ανοικτού τομέα μέσω της Bayesian Inference', 'hu': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Egyidejű szövegszegmentáció és szófelfedezés nyílt tartományú kínai szövegekhez bayesi fertőzésen keresztül', 'it': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Segmentazione simultanea del testo e ricerca di parole per testi cinesi a dominio aperto tramite inferenza bayesiana', 'kk': 'TopWORDS- Seg: Байезия инференциясы арқылы Open- Domain қытайша мәтіндерінің бірнеше мәтін сегментациясы мен сөздерді табу', 'lt': 'Aukščiausiojo lygio žodžių segmentacija ir žodžių atskleidimas atviro domeno Kinijos tekstams per Bayesian Inference', 'mk': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultaneous Text Segmentation and Word Discovery for Open-Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference', 'ms': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Segmentasi Teks Sementara dan Penemuan Perkataan untuk Teks Cina Domain Buka melalui Inferensi Bayesian', 'mn': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Bayesian Inference-р ашиглах домены Хятад текстүүдийн хувьд төстэй мөр хэвлэлт болон үг олох', 'mt': 'TopWORDS-Segment: Segmentazzjoni simultanja tat-test u skoperta tal-kliem għal testi Ċiniżi b’dominju miftuħ permezz tal-Inferenza Bayesiana', 'ml': 'മുകളിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d', 'no': 'ToppWORDS- Seg: Simulert tekstsegmentasjon og ord oppdaging for Open- Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference', 'pl': 'TopWORDS-Segment: Jednoczesna segmentacja tekstu i wykrywanie słów dla chińskich tekstów otwartych w domenie poprzez Bayesian Inference', 'ro': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Segmentarea simultană a textelor și descoperirea de cuvinte pentru texte chinezești cu domeniu deschis prin inferență bayesiană', 'sr': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultarna segmentacija teksta i otkrivanje riječi za otvorene domene kineske tekstove preko Bayesianske inferencije', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultaneous Text Segmentation and Word Discovery for Open-Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference', 'sv': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Samtidig textsegmentering och ordsökning för kinesiska texter med öppen domän via bayesian inferens', 'ur': 'Top WORDS-Seg: Bayesian Inference کے ذریعے اوپن-دامین چینی ٹیکسٹ کے لئے سیمولٹنی ٹیکسٹمنٹ اور کلمات دیسکونٹ', 'ta': 'மேல் WORDS- துண்டு: பெயிசியன் புகுந்தகத்தின் மூலம் திறந்த டொமைன் சீனா உரைகளுக்கான உரை பிரிவு மற்றும் வார்த்தை பிடி', 'uz': 'Yuqori WORDS- Seg: Oddiy matn oĘ»lchami va soĘ»zni ochish uchun Xitoycha matn', 'vi': 'Đầu đề: Chia cắt đoạn văn bản đồng thời và giảm giá từ cho các văn bản Trung Quốc Open-Domain qua nhiều liên hệ Bayesian', 'bg': 'Едновременна текстова сегментация и откриване на думи за китайски текстове с отворен домейн чрез Байезианска inferенция', 'hr': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultarna segmentacija teksta i otkrivanje riječi za otvorene domene kineske tekste preko Bayesian Inference', 'da': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Samtidig tekstsegmentering og Word Discovery for Open-Domain kinesiske tekster via Bayesian Inference', 'nl': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultane Tekstsegmentatie en Woordontdekking voor Open-Domain Chinese Teksten via Bayesian Inference', 'de': 'TopWORDS-Segment: Simultane Textsegmentierung und Worterkennung für Open-Domain chinesische Texte mittels Bayesian Inference', 'id': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Segmentasi Teks Sementara dan Penemuan Kata untuk Teks Cina Domain Buka melalui Inferensi Bayesian', 'ko': 'TopWORDS Seg: 베일스의 추리를 바탕으로 한 개방된 영역의 중국어 텍스트 동시 절분과 단어 발견', 'fa': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Segmentation Text Simulation and Word Discovery for Open-Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference', 'sw': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultaneous Text Segmentation and Word Discovery for Open-Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference', 'tr': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Bayesian Inference bilen Aç-Domain Çinçe Metinler üçin Samlany Metin Segmentation we Word Discovery', 'af': 'TopWORDS- Seg: Simuleerde Teks Segmentasie en Woord Ontdekking vir Open- Domein Sjinese Teks deur Bayesian Inferensie', 'sq': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Segmentacioni simultan i tekstit dhe zbulimi i fjalëve për tekstet kineze me domini të hapur nëpërmjet Bayesian Inference', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Bayesian Inference vasit톛sil톛 A칞캼q-Domain 칂in Metinl톛r 칲칞칲n b톛nz톛r Metin Segmentasyonu v톛 Kelimi Kitab캼', 'hy': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultaneous Text Segmentation and Word Discovery for Open-Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference', 'bn': 'TopWORDS-Seg: একই সাথে টেক্সট বিভাগ এবং শব্দ বিভাগ বেয়েসিয়ান ইনফারেন্সের মাধ্যমে খোলা ডোমেইনের চীনা টেক্সটের জন্য শব্দ ব', 'bs': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultarna segmentacija teksta i otkrivanje riječi za otvorene domene kineske tekste preko Bayesian Inference', 'cs': 'TopWORDS-Segment: Současná segmentace textu a zjišťování slov pro čínské texty s otevřenou doménou prostřednictvím Bayesovské inference', 'ca': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Segmentació simultànea de textos i descobriment de paraules per a textos xinesos de domini obert a través de Bayesian Inference', 'et': 'TopWORDS-Seg: üheaegne teksti segmenteerimine ja sõnavaatlus avatud domeeniga hiina tekstide jaoks bayesia järelduse kaudu', 'fi': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Samanaikainen tekstisegmentointi ja sanahaku avoimen verkkotunnuksen kiinalaisille teksteille bayesilaisen inferenssin avulla', 'jv': 'TOWWords-segment: Simultaneous Text segmentation and Word Diskival for Open-domain Chinese Text', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Sočasna segmentacija besedila in iskanje besed za kitajska besedila z odprto domeno prek bajzijske sklepe', 'he': 'סג העליון: Segmentation Text Simultaneous and Word Discovery for Open-Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference', 'bo': 'TopWORDS-Seg: Simultaneous Text Segmentation and Word Discovery for Open-Domain Chinese Texts via Bayesian Inference'}
{'en': 'Tables are often created with hierarchies but existing works on table reasoning mainly focus on flat tables and neglect hierarchical tables Hierarchical tables challenge numerical reasoning by complex hierarchical indexing as well as implicit relationships of calculation and semantics We present a new dataset HiTab to study question answering QA and natural language generation NLG over hierarchical tables HiTab is a cross domain dataset constructed from a wealth of statistical reports and Wikipedia pages and has unique characteristics nearly all tables are hierarchical and QA pairs are not proposed by annotators from scratch but are revised from real and meaningful sentences authored by analysts to reveal complex numerical reasoning in statistical reports we provide fine grained annotations of quantity and entity alignment Experiments suggest that this HiTab presents a strong challenge for existing baselines and a valuable benchmark for future research Targeting hierarchical structure we devise a hierarchy aware logical form for symbolic reasoning over tables which shows high effectiveness Targeting table reasoning we leverage entity and quantity alignment to explore partially supervised training in QA and conditional generation in NLG and largely reduce spurious predictions in QA and produce better descriptions in NLG', 'ar': 'لطالما كانت معالجة النصوص الصينية ذات المجال المفتوح عقبة حرجة في اللغويات الحاسوبية لعقود ، ويرجع ذلك جزئيًا إلى أن تجزئة النص واكتشاف الكلمات غالبًا ما يتشابكان مع بعضهما البعض في هذا السيناريو الصعب. لا توجد طرق حالية حتى الآن يمكنها تحقيق تجزئة نصية فعالة واكتشاف الكلمات في وقت واحد في مجال مفتوح. تملأ هذه الدراسة هذه الفجوة من خلال اقتراح طريقة جديدة تسمى TopWORDS-Seg بناءً على الاستدلال البايزي ، والتي تتمتع بأداء قوي وتفسير شفاف في حالة عدم توفر مجموعة تدريب ومفردات المجال. تم توضيح مزايا TopWORDS-Seg من خلال سلسلة من الدراسات التجريبية.', 'pt': 'O processamento de textos chineses de domínio aberto tem sido um gargalo crítico na linguística computacional há décadas, em parte porque a segmentação de texto e a descoberta de palavras muitas vezes se confundem nesse cenário desafiador. Nenhum método existente ainda pode alcançar segmentação de texto eficaz e descoberta de palavras simultaneamente em domínio aberto. Este estudo preenche essa lacuna ao propor um novo método chamado TopWORDS-Seg baseado em inferência Bayesiana, que apresenta desempenho robusto e interpretação transparente quando não há corpus de treinamento e vocabulário de domínio disponíveis. As vantagens do TopWORDS-Seg são demonstradas por uma série de estudos experimentais.', 'fr': "Le traitement de textes chinois de domaine ouvert constitue un goulot d'étranglement critique en linguistique informatique depuis des décennies, en partie parce que la segmentation de texte et la découverte de mots s'entremêlent souvent dans ce scénario difficile. Aucune méthode existante ne permet encore d'obtenir simultanément une segmentation de texte et une découverte de mots efficaces dans un domaine ouvert. Cette étude comble cette lacune en proposant une nouvelle méthode appelée TopWords-SEG basée sur l'inférence bayésienne, qui bénéficie de performances robustes et d'une interprétation transparente lorsqu'aucun corpus de formation et aucun vocabulaire de domaine ne sont disponibles. Les avantages de TopWords-SEG sont démontrés par une série d'études expérimentales.", 'es': 'El procesamiento de textos chinos de dominio abierto ha sido un cuello de botella crítico en la lingüística computacional durante décadas, en parte porque la segmentación de textos y el descubrimiento de palabras a menudo se enredan entre sí en este escenario desafiante. Todavía no hay métodos existentes que puedan lograr una segmentación de texto y un descubrimiento de palabras eficaces simultáneamente en dominio abierto. Este estudio llena este vacío al proponer un método novedoso llamado TopWords-Seg basado en la inferencia bayesiana, que disfruta de un rendimiento sólido y una interpretación transparente cuando no hay disponible ningún corpus de entrenamiento ni vocabulario de dominio. Las ventajas de Topwords-SEG se demuestran mediante una serie de estudios experimentales.', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの中国語テキストを処理することは、この困難なシナリオでテキストセグメンテーションと単語の発見がしばしば互いに絡み合うため、数十年にわたって計算言語学における重要なボトルネックでした。オープンドメインで効果的なテキストセグメンテーションと単語検出を同時に実現できる既存の方法はありません。この研究は、トレーニングのコーパスとドメインのボキャブラリーが利用できない場合に、堅牢なパフォーマンスと透明な解釈を享受する、ベイズ推論に基づいたTopWORDS - Segと呼ばれる新規の方法を提案することで、このギャップを埋めます。TopWORDS - Segの利点は、一連の実験研究によって実証されている。', 'zh': '数十年间,开域中文本,直是算语言学要瓶颈,盖文本分单词,常见此挑战性常相纠缠也。 未有见法可于开域同时有效者,分单词见之。 此论以贝叶斯理名TopWORDS-Seg新法补之,当于未练语料库和域词汇表享强大之解。 TopWORDS-Seg之势实验论得其验。', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन चीनी ग्रंथों को संसाधित करना दशकों से कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान में एक महत्वपूर्ण बाधा रहा है, आंशिक रूप से क्योंकि पाठ विभाजन और शब्द खोज अक्सर इस चुनौतीपूर्ण परिदृश्य में एक-दूसरे के साथ उलझते हैं। कोई भी मौजूदा विधियाँ अभी तक खुले डोमेन में एक साथ प्रभावी पाठ विभाजन और शब्द खोज प्राप्त नहीं कर सकती हैं। यह अध्ययन बायेसियन अनुमान के आधार पर TopWORDS-Seg नामक एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करके इस अंतर को भरता है, जो मजबूत प्रदर्शन और पारदर्शी व्याख्या का आनंद लेता है जब कोई प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस और डोमेन शब्दावली उपलब्ध नहीं होती है। TopWORDS-Seg के लाभ प्रयोगात्मक अध्ययनों की एक श्रृंखला द्वारा प्रदर्शित किए जाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Обработка китайских текстов с открытым доменом была критическим узким местом в вычислительной лингвистике на протяжении десятилетий, частично потому, что сегментация текста и раскрытие слов часто переплетаются друг с другом в этом сложном сценарии. Никакие существующие методы пока не могут достичь эффективной сегментации текста и обнаружения слов одновременно в открытом домене. Это исследование заполняет этот пробел, предлагая новый метод под названием TopWORDS-Seg, основанный на байесовском выводе, который пользуется надежной производительностью и прозрачной интерпретацией, когда нет учебного корпуса и доменного словаря. Преимущества TopWORDS-Seg продемонстрированы серией экспериментальных исследований.', 'ga': 'Tá próiseáil a dhéanamh ar théacsanna Síneacha oscailte ina mbac ríthábhachtach sa ríomhtheangeolaíocht le blianta fada anuas, go páirteach toisc go mbíonn deighilt téacs agus fionnachtain focal i dteagmháil lena chéile go minic sa chás dúshlánach seo. Ní féidir le modhanna ar bith atá ann cheana deighilt éifeachtach téacs agus aimsiú focal a bhaint amach go comhuaineach san fhearann oscailte. Líonann an staidéar seo an bhearna seo trí mhodh úrnua a mholadh ar a dtugtar TopWORDS-Seg atá bunaithe ar thátal Bayesian, a bhaineann taitneamh as feidhmíocht láidir agus léirmhíniú trédhearcach nuair nach bhfuil corpas oiliúna agus stór focal fearainn ar fáil. Léirítear na buntáistí a bhaineann le TopWORDS-Seg le sraith staidéar turgnamhach.', 'ka': 'გახსნა დიომინის ტექსტის პროცესი ათეულობით კომპუტაციალური ლენგურისტიკის კრიტიკური ბოლობი იყო, რადგან ტექსტის სეგმენტაცია და სიტყვების აღმოჩენება ზოგიერთად ერთმანეთს ამ შე არაფერი არსებობი მეტოვები უკვე შეიძლება ეფექტიური ტექსექსმენტის სექმენტის და სიტყვების აღმოჩენა ერთადერთად დიომინში. ეს სწავლება ამ განსხვავებას შეუძლიათ პრომენტის მეტი, რომელიც სახელია TopWORDS-Seg, ბაიზიანის ინფრენციაზე დაბაზიან, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენება და ცნობიერი განსხვავება, როდესაც არაფერი კო TopWORDS-Seg-ის კონტანტაციები ექსპერიმენტალური სწავლებით მოდემონსებულია.', 'hu': 'A nyílt domain kínai szövegek feldolgozása évtizedek óta kritikus szűk keresztmetszetet jelent a számítástechnikai nyelvészetben, részben azért, mert a szövegszegmentáció és a szófelfedezés gyakran összekapcsolódik egymással ebben a kihívást jelentő forgatókönyvben. Egyetlen meglévő módszer sem képes hatékony szövegszegmentálást és szófelfedezést elérni egyidejűleg nyílt tartományban. Ez a tanulmány a bayesi következtetésen alapuló TopWORDS-Seg új módszert javasol, amely erőteljes teljesítményt és átlátható értelmezést élvez, ha nem áll rendelkezésre edzési korpusz és domain szókincs. A TopWORDS-Seg előnyeit kísérleti vizsgálatok sorozata bizonyítja.', 'el': 'Η επεξεργασία κινεζικών κειμένων ανοικτού τομέα αποτελεί κρίσιμο εμπόδιο στην υπολογιστική γλωσσολογία για δεκαετίες, εν μέρει επειδή η τμηματοποίηση κειμένου και η ανακάλυψη λέξεων συχνά εμπλέκονται μεταξύ τους σε αυτό το δύσκολο σενάριο. Καμία υπάρχουσα μέθοδος ακόμα δεν μπορεί να επιτύχει αποτελεσματική τμηματοποίηση κειμένου και ανακάλυψη λέξεων ταυτόχρονα σε ανοικτό τομέα. Η μελέτη αυτή συμπληρώνει αυτό το κενό προτείνοντας μια νέα μέθοδο που ονομάζεται βασισμένη στην Bayesian συμπέρασμα, η οποία απολαμβάνει ισχυρή απόδοση και διαφανή ερμηνεία όταν δεν είναι διαθέσιμο εκπαιδευτικό σώμα και λεξιλόγιο τομέα. Τα πλεονεκτήματα του αποδεικνύονται από μια σειρά πειραματικών μελετών.', 'it': "L'elaborazione di testi cinesi a dominio aperto è stata una strozzatura critica nella linguistica computazionale per decenni, in parte perché la segmentazione del testo e la scoperta di parole spesso si intralciano tra loro in questo scenario impegnativo. Nessun metodo esistente può ancora raggiungere una segmentazione efficace del testo e la scoperta di parole contemporaneamente in open domain. Questo studio colma questa lacuna proponendo un nuovo metodo chiamato TopWORDS-Seg basato sull'inferenza bayesiana, che gode di prestazioni robuste e di interpretazione trasparente quando non sono disponibili corpus di formazione e vocabolario di dominio. I vantaggi di TopWORDS-Seg sono dimostrati da una serie di studi sperimentali.", 'mk': 'Процесирањето на кинеските тексти со отворен домен е критично пречка во компјутативната јазика со децении, делумно затоа што текстовата сегментација и откритието на зборови честопати се вмешаат меѓусебно во овој предизвикувачки сценарио. Сеуште нема постоечки методи кои можат да постигнат ефикасна текстова сегментација и истовремено откривање на зборови во отворен домен. Оваа студија ја исполнува оваа празнина предлагајќи нов метод наречен TopWORDS-Seg базиран на бајезиската инференција, кој ужива во силна перформанса и транспарентна интерпретација кога не се достапни обуки на корпус и домен речник. Напредностите на TopWORDS-Seg се демонстрирани од серија експериментални студии.', 'lt': 'Atviros srities Kinijos tekstų apdorojimas jau dešimtmečius yra esminis kompiuterinės kalbos trūkumas, iš dalies dėl to, kad tekstų segmentavimas ir žodžių atradimas dažnai siejasi su viena kita šiame sunkiame scenarijuje. Nėra esamų metodų, kuriais būtų galima pasiekti veiksmingą teksto segmentaciją ir žodžių aptikimą atviroje srityje. Šis tyrimas užpildo šią spragą pasiūlydamas naują metodą, vadinamą TopWORDS-Seg, pagrįstą Bayezijos išvadomis, kuriame yra patikimų rezultatų ir skaidrus aiškinimas, kai nėra mokymo korpuso ir domeno žodyno. TopWORDS-Seg nauda įrodoma kelių eksperimentinių tyrimų metu.', 'kk': 'Ашылған домен қытайша мәтіндерді өзгерту ондық жылдар бойы компьютерлік лингвистикалық тілдерінде көпшілік болды, бөлек сегментация мен сөздерді табу үшін бұл көпшілікті сценарияда бір-бірімен бірге қа Бар әдістер әлі эффективті мәтін сегментациясын және сөздерді бірден ашылған доменде табуға болмайды. Бұл зерттеу байезия инференциясына негізделген TopWORDS-Seg деп аталатын романдық әдістерін толтыруға болады. Бұл корпус мен домендің сөз сөздері қол жеткізбеген кезде жұмыс істеу және мөлдірлі түсініктемесін TopWORDS- Seg- тың алдыңғылары бірнеше тәжірибелі зерттеулер арқылы көрсетіледі.', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമൈന്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കണക്കിനുള്ള ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ ബോട്ട്ലെന്\u200dസിക്ക് ആയിരുന്നു. പകുതിയാണ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ ഇപ്പോഴും നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വിഭാഗവും വാക്കുകളും ഒരേ സമയത്ത് തുറന്ന ഡോമെയിന ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിറയ്ക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d നിറയ്ക്കുന്നു. ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d അപരിഹാരം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ ടോപ്വോര്\u200dഡ്സ്-സെഗിന്റെ മുന്നറിയിപ്പുകള്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടാണ്.', 'ms': 'Memproses teks Cina-domain terbuka telah menjadi tekanan kritik dalam bahasa komputasi selama dekade, sebahagian kerana segmentasi teks dan penemuan perkataan sering berkaitan dengan satu sama lain dalam skenario mencabar ini. Tiada kaedah yang wujud masih boleh mencapai segmen teks yang efektif dan penemuan perkataan secara bersamaan dalam domain terbuka. Ujian ini memenuhi ruang ini dengan melamar kaedah novel yang dipanggil TopWORDS-Seg berdasarkan kesimpulan Bayesian, yang menikmati prestasi yang kuat dan interpretasi yang jelas apabila tiada korpus latihan dan vokbulari domain tersedia. Keuntungan TopWORDS-Seg dipaparkan oleh satu siri kajian percubaan.', 'mt': 'L-ipproċessar ta’ testi Ċiniżi b’dominju miftuħ ilu ostaklu kritiku fil-lingwistika tal-komputazzjoni għal għexieren ta’ snin, parzjalment minħabba li s-segmentazzjoni tat-test u l-iskoperta tal-kliem spiss jinvolvu lil xulxin f’dan ix-xenarju ta’ sfida. L-ebda metodu eżistenti għadu ma jista’ jikseb segmentazzjoni effettiva tat-test u skoperta tal-kliem simultanjament f’dominju miftuħ. This study fills in this gap by proposing a novel method called TopWORDS-Seg based on Bayesian inference, which enjoys robust performance and transparent interpretation when no training corpus and domain vocabulary are available.  Il-vantaġġi ta’ TopWORDS-Seg jintwerew minn serje ta’ studji sperimentali.', 'no': 'Prosessering av open-domain kinesiske tekstar har vært ein kritisk botnekk i datamaskinen i tidlegare tiår, delvis fordi tekstsegmentasjon og ordoppdaging ofte gjer kvarandre i denne vanskeleg scenarioen. Ingen eksisterande metodar kan noko oppnå effektiv tekstsegmentering og ord oppdaging samtidig i opna domene. Denne studien fyller i denne mellomrommet ved å foreslå ein roman metode kalla TopWORDS-Seg basert på Bayesian-inference, som nyttar robust utvikling og gjennomsiktig tolking når ingen opplæringskorpus og domeneordbok er tilgjengeleg. Avantasjonar av TopWORDS-Seg vert demonstrert av ein rekke eksperimentelt studiar.', 'pl': 'Przetwarzanie chińskich tekstów o otwartej domenie od dziesięcioleci stanowi kluczowe gardło w językoznawstwie obliczeniowym, częściowo dlatego, że segmentacja tekstu i odkrywanie słów często splątają się ze sobą w tym trudnym scenariuszu. Żadne istniejące metody nie mogą osiągnąć efektywnej segmentacji tekstu i wykrywania słów jednocześnie w otwartej domenie. Badanie to wypełnia tę lukę, proponując nową metodę o nazwie TopWORDS-Seg opartą na wnioskach Bayesowskich, która cieszy się solidną wydajnością i przejrzystą interpretacją, gdy nie jest dostępny korpus treningowy i słownictwo domeny. Zalety TopWORDS-Seg zostały wykazane przez serię badań eksperymentalnych.', 'ro': 'Procesarea textelor chinezești cu domeniu deschis a fost un blocaj critic în lingvistica computațională timp de decenii, parțial deoarece segmentarea textului și descoperirea de cuvinte adesea se încurcă între ele în acest scenariu provocator. Nicio metodă existentă nu poate obține încă segmentarea eficientă a textului și descoperirea de cuvinte simultan în domeniu deschis. Acest studiu umple acest decalaj propunând o metodă nouă numită TopWORDS-Seg bazată pe inferența bayesiană, care se bucură de performanță robustă și interpretare transparentă atunci când nu sunt disponibile corpuri de formare și vocabular domeniu. Avantajele TopWORDS-Seg sunt demonstrate printr-o serie de studii experimentale.', 'mn': 'Хятадын нээлттэй холбоотой текстүүдийг ажиллах нь арван жилийн турш тооцоолон хэлний хэлний хувьд чухал бөгөөд хэсэг хэлбэрээр текст хэсэг болон үгийг олж мэдэх нь ихэвчлэн энэ хэцүү хувилбарт холбоотой. Харин одоо ч байхгүй арга барилгыг нээлттэй холбоотой хэлбэрээр үр дүнтэй текст хэлбэрээр, үг олж мэдэх боломжгүй. Энэ судалгаа "TopWORDS-Seg" гэдэг шинэ аргыг байзезийн халдвар дээр суурилуулж байна. Энэ нь сургалтын корпус болон сүлжээний үг байхгүй үед шаардлагатай үйл ажиллагаа болон тодорхой тодорхойлолт ашигладаг. TopWORDS-Seg-ын урам зориулалт олон туршилтын судалгаагаар дүрслэгддэг.', 'sr': 'Proveravanje otvorenog domena kineskih tekstova veæ desetljeæima je kritično slabost u raèunalnoj lingvistiki, djelomično zato što su segmentacija teksta i otkrivanje rijeèi često povezani jedni sa drugima u ovom izazovnom scenariju. Nijedna postojeća metoda još ne može postići efikasnu segmentaciju teksta i otkrivanje riječi istovremeno u otvorenom domenu. Ova studija ispunjava tu prazninu predloživši novu metodu pod nazivom TopWORDS-Seg, baziranu na infekciji Bejzije, koja uživa u robnoj funkciji i transparentnoj interpretaciji kada nema slobodnog korpusa i ročnika domena. Prednosti TopWORDS-Seg pokazuju niz eksperimentalnih ispitivanja.', 'so': 'Isticmaalidda qoraalaha furan ee Shiino waxay noqotay baaruud muhiim ah oo ku qoran luuqadaha xisaabta, qayb ka mid ah sababtoo ah qeybta isqabsashada qoraalka iyo iskuulka hadalka qaarkood qaarka badan ayaa isla xiriira halkan dhibaataysan. Heeganka waxyaabaha ku jira weli ma heli karo habab faa’iido ah oo ku habboon goobta furan. Waxbarashadan wuxuu ku buuxinayaa gafafkan marka loo soo jeedo qaab warqad ah oo la yidhaahdo TopWORDS-Seg oo ku saleysan baaritaanka Bayesian, kaas oo ku raaxaysta muuqashada robust iyo turjumista muuqda, haddii aan la helin aqoonsiga iyo afka domain. Horumarinta TopWORDS-Seg waxaa lagu muujiyaa waxbarasho imtixaan badan.', 'sv': 'Bearbetning av kinesiska texter med öppen domän har varit en kritisk flaskhals inom datorlingvistik i årtionden, delvis på grund av att textsegmentering och ordupptäckt ofta sammanflätas med varandra i detta utmanande scenario. Inga befintliga metoder kan ännu uppnå effektiv textsegmentering och ordupptäckt samtidigt i öppen domän. Denna studie fyller denna lucka genom att föreslå en ny metod kallad TopWORDS-Seg baserad på Bayesian inference, som åtnjuter robust prestanda och transparent tolkning när ingen träningskorpus och domänvokabulär finns tillgänglig. Fördelarna med TopWORDS-Seg demonstreras genom en serie experimentella studier.', 'si': 'විවෘත්ත චීනි පාළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය විශාල භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක වලින් විශාල භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, අංක වලින තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ විධානයක් තාමත් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශේෂය සහ වචනය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ නෑ. මේ පරීක්ෂණය බේසියාන් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් අධාරිත විදිහට පුරවර්තනය කරන්නේ මේ විදිහට පුරවර්තන විදිහට, බේසියාන් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් අධාරිත විදිහ Top WORDS-SEG ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්ණය කරනවා පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණාවක් වලින්.', 'ta': 'திறந்த டோமைன் உரைகளை செயல்படுத்துவது பல ஆண்டுகளாக கணக்கிடும் மொழிகளில் ஒரு குறிப்பான பாட்டில் இருக்கிறது, பாகமாக ஏனெனில் உரை பிரிவு மற்றும் வார்த்தை கண தற்போதைய முறைமைகள் இல்லை இன்னும் திறந்த களத்தில் பயனுள்ள உரை துண்டு மற்றும் சொல்லை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியாது. இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி முறைமையை பேயிசியன் பாதிப்பு அடிப்படையில் செய்யும் போது புதிய முறைமையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் போது இந்த இடைவெளியில் நிரப்பும், பயிற் TopWORDS-Seg முன்னேற்றங்கள் சில சோதனையான ஆய்வுகளால் காண்பிக்கப்படுகின்றன.', 'ur': 'اوپن ڈومین چینی ٹیکسٹوں کی پروسس کرنا دس سالوں کے لئے کمپیوٹریشن زبان شناسی میں ایک ضروری بٹلک ہے، کچھ حصہ اس لئے کہ ٹیکسٹ سیگنٹ اور لفظ اچھی طرح ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ ایک دوسرے سے اس مشکل سناریو میں شامل ہوتا ہے۔ اب تک کوئی موجود طریقہ نہیں پہنچا سکتی ہے کہ پاکستان سگرمینٹ اور کلمات کا اگلے ڈومینٹ میں ایک دفعہ پیدا کرے۔ This study fills in this gap by proposing a new method called TopWORDS-Seg based on Bayesian inference, which enjoys robust performance and transparent interpretation when no training corpus and domain vocabulary are available. TopWORDS-Seg کی پیشنهاد ایک سری تجربہ تحقیقات کے ذریعے دکھائی جاتی ہیں.', 'uz': "Ochiq domen textlarini boshqarish yil yil yil ichida kompyuterlik tillarida muhim bog'liq edi, qismkiz sababi matn ajratilishi va so'zning qismlarini ko'pincha o'z murakkab o'zgarishda bir-бирлари bilan bog'liq. @ info: whatsthis Bu o'qituvni o'zgartirib turadi, Bayxi asosida yaratilgan TopWORDS-Seg (TopWORDS-Seg) nomli novel usulini rivojlanadi. Bu taʼminlovchi kompyuter va domen lugʻatlari mavjud emas boʻlmaganda, robot bajarish imkoniyatini va shaffof tarjima qiladi. TopWORDS-segning taʼminotlari bir necha tizim taʼminlovchilar orqali koʻrsatiladi.", 'vi': 'Chế độ xử lý văn bản Trung Quốc mở miền đã là một tắc nghẽn quan trọng trong ngôn ngữ tính trong hàng thập kỷ, một phần vì phân đoạn văn bản và phát hiện từ thường phức tạp với nhau trong tình huống khó khăn này. Chưa có phương pháp nào có thể đạt được hiệu quả phân chia văn bản và phát hiện từ cùng lúc trong công thức mở. Nghiên cứu này lấp đầy khoảng trống này bằng cách đề xuất một phương pháp mới được gọi là Topwords-Seg dựa trên ngụ ý người Bayesian, và được giải thích rõ ràng khi không có tập thể và từ điển miền. Lợi thế của Topwords-Seg được chứng minh bằng một loạt thử nghiệm nghiên cứu.', 'bg': 'Обработката на отворен домейн китайски текстове е критична пречка в компютърната лингвистика в продължение на десетилетия, отчасти защото сегментацията на текста и откриването на думи често се преплитат един с друг в този предизвикателен сценарий. Никакви съществуващи методи все още не могат да постигнат ефективна сегментация на текста и откриване на думи едновременно в отворен домейн. Това изследване запълва тази празнота, като предлага нов метод, наречен базиран на Байсийски извод, който се радва на солидна производителност и прозрачна интерпретация, когато няма тренировъчен корпус и домейнен речник. Предимствата на ТопWORDS-Seg са демонстрирани чрез серия от експериментални проучвания.', 'da': 'Behandling af åbent domæne kinesiske tekster har været en kritisk flaskehals i beregningslingvistik i årtier, delvis fordi tekstsegmentering og ordopdagelse ofte indbyrdes i dette udfordrende scenario. Ingen eksisterende metoder kan endnu opnå effektiv tekstsegmentering og ordopdagelse samtidig i åbent domæne. Denne undersøgelse udfylder dette hul ved at foreslå en ny metode kaldet TopWORDS-Seg baseret på Bayesian inference, som nyder robust ydeevne og gennemsigtig fortolkning, når der ikke er nogen træningskorpus og domænenordforråd til rådighed. Fordelene ved TopWORDS-Seg er demonstreret af en række eksperimentelle undersøgelser.', 'hr': 'Proizvodnja otvorenog domena kineskih tekstova već desetljećima bila je kritična slabost u računalnoj lingvistiki, djelomično zato što segmentacija teksta i otkrivanje riječi često se uključuju međusobno u ovom izazovnom scenariju. Nijedna postojeća metoda još ne može postići učinkovitu segmentaciju teksta i otkrivanje riječi istovremeno u otvorenom domenu. Ova ispitivanja ispunjava taj praznik predloživši novu metodu pod nazivom TopWORDS-Seg baziranu na infekciji Bayesije, koja uživa u jačinoj učinkovitosti i transparentnoj interpretaciji kada nije dostupna riječ o obuci korpusa i domenu. Prednosti TopWORDS-Seg pokazuju niz eksperimentalnih ispitivanja.', 'nl': 'Het verwerken van open-domein Chinese teksten is al tientallen jaren een cruciale knelpunt in de computerlinguïstiek, mede omdat tekstsegmentatie en woordontdekking vaak met elkaar verstrikt raken in dit uitdagende scenario. Nog geen bestaande methoden kunnen effectieve tekstsegmentatie en woordontdekking gelijktijdig bereiken in open domein. Deze studie vult deze kloof op door een nieuwe methode voor te stellen genaamd TopWORDS-Seg gebaseerd op Bayesiaanse inferentie, die robuuste prestaties en transparante interpretatie geniet wanneer er geen trainingscorpus en vakwoordenschat beschikbaar zijn. De voordelen van TopWORDS-Seg worden aangetoond door een reeks experimentele studies.', 'de': 'Die Verarbeitung offener chinesischer Texte ist seit Jahrzehnten ein kritischer Engpass in der Computerlinguistik, teilweise weil Textsegmentierung und Wortfindung in diesem herausfordernden Szenario häufig ineinander greifen. Noch keine existierenden Methoden können eine effektive Textsegmentierung und Worterkennung gleichzeitig in offener Domäne erreichen. Diese Studie schließt diese Lücke, indem sie eine neue Methode namens TopWORDS-Seg vorschlägt, die auf Bayesischer Inferenz basiert, die robuste Leistung und transparente Interpretation genießt, wenn kein Trainingskorpus und kein Domänenvokabular verfügbar sind. Die Vorteile von TopWORDS-Seg werden durch eine Reihe experimenteller Studien nachgewiesen.', 'id': 'Memproses teks Cina dengan domain terbuka telah menjadi masalah kritis dalam bahasa komputasi selama dekade, sebagian karena segmentasi teks dan penemuan kata sering berkaitan dengan satu sama lain dalam skenario yang menantang ini. Belum ada metode yang ada yang dapat mencapai segmen teks yang efektif dan penemuan kata secara bersamaan dalam domain terbuka. Studi ini mengisi ruang ini dengan mengusulkan metode novel bernama TopWORDS-Seg berdasarkan kesimpulan Bayesia, yang menikmati prestasi yang kuat dan interpretasi transparan ketika tidak ada pelatihan corpus dan vokbulari domain tersedia. Keuntungan dari TopWORDS-Seg diperkenalkan oleh serangkaian studi percobaan.', 'ko': '수십 년 동안 개방역의 중국어 텍스트를 처리하는 것은 계산언어학의 관건적인 병목이었다. 일부 원인은 이런 도전적인 상황에서 텍스트 분할과 단어 발견이 서로 얽히기 때문이다.개방된 영역에서 효과적인 텍스트 분할과 단어 발견을 동시에 실현할 수 있는 방법은 아직 없다.본 연구는 베일스의 추리를 바탕으로 하는 TopWORDS-Seg 방법을 제시하여 어료 라이브러리와 영역 어휘를 훈련하지 않은 상황에서 이 방법은 좋은 성능과 투명한 해석 능력을 가지고 이 공백을 메웠다.일련의 실험 연구가 TopWORDS Seg의 장점을 증명했습니다.', 'fa': 'پرداخت متن های چینی باز دامنی برای دهه\u200cها یک بطری مهم در زبان\u200cشناسی کامپیوتری است، بخشی از این دلیل که بخشیدن متن و کشف کلمات اغلب در این سناریو مشکل با یکدیگر متصل می\u200cشوند. هنوز هیچ روش موجود وجود ندارد که بتواند بخش متن موثر و کشف کلمات را در دومین باز به دست آورد. این مطالعه با پیشنهاد روشی نویسی به نام TopWORDS-Seg بر اساس آلودگی بیزیایی پر می\u200cشود که از عملکرد ثابت و تعبیر شفافیت لذت می\u200cبرد وقتی کلمه\u200cهای آموزش و دومین در دسترس نیستند. پیشنهاد TopWORDS-Seg توسط یک سری تحقیقات آزمایشی نشان داده می شوند.', 'sw': 'Kupambana na ujumbe huru wa Kichina umekuwa ukiukosoaji mkubwa katika lugha ya kompyuta kwa miongo kadhaa, sehemu ya kwa sababu utofauti wa maandishi na uvumbuzi wa maneno mara nyingi huwa wanahusiana na wao katika tukio hili la changamoto. Hakuna mbinu zilizopo bado zinaweza kufikia mgawanyiko wenye ufanisi wa maandishi na maneno yanayogundua wakati mmoja katika eneo la wazi. Utafiti huu unajaza katika kipande hiki kwa kupendekeza mbinu za riwaya inayoitwa TopWORDS-Seg kwa kutumia maambukizi ya Bayesia, ambayo inafurahia utendaji wa kibaguzi na tafsiri ya uwazi wakati hakuna mafunzo na maneno ya ndani yanayopatikana. Maonyesho ya Sehemu ya TopWORDS yanaonyeshwa na mfululizo wa tafiti za majaribio.', 'af': "Verwerking van open-domein Sjinese teks is 'n kritiese botnek in rekenaasjonale lingvistike vir dekades, gedeeltelik omdat teks segmentasie en woord ontdekking dikwels met mekaar in hierdie pragtige scenario gehandel is. Geen bestaande metodes kan nog effektief teks segmentasie en woord ontdekking eintlik in oop domein bereik nie. Hierdie studie vul in hierdie gap deur 'n roman metode wat genoem word TopWORDS-Seg gebaseer op Bayesian inferensie te voorstel, wat vrymoedige prestasie en deursigtige uitlegging verkies wanneer geen oefening korpus en domein woordeboek beskikbaar is nie. Vorderings van TopWORDS-Seg word deur 'n reeks eksperimentale studie bevestig.", 'sq': 'Procesimi i teksteve kineze me domeni të hapur ka qenë një pengesë kritike në gjuhën llogaritare për dekada, pjesërisht sepse segmentimi i tekstit dhe zbulimi i fjalëve shpesh përfshihen me njëri-tjetrin në këtë skenar sfidues. Asnjë metodë ekzistuese ende nuk mund të arrijë segmentimin efektiv të tekstit dhe zbulimin e fjalëve në të njëjtën kohë në domeni të hapur. Ky studim mbush këtë boshllëk duke propozuar një metodë të re të quajtur TopWORDS-Seg bazuar në inferencën bayesiane, e cila gëzon shfaqje të fortë dhe interpretim transparent kur nuk janë në dispozicion asnjë korpus trajnimi dhe fjalor domini. Avantazhet e TopWORDS-Seg demonstrohen nga një seri studimesh eksperimentale.', 'am': 'የቻይና ጽሑፎች የተከፈቱት የቻይና ጽሑፎች ለዐሥር ዓመታት በመቆጣጠር ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ አካባቢ አፍስቷል፡፡ የጽሑፍ ክፍተት እና ቃላት በመስጠት በተከፈተ ድምፅ ውስጥ ለማግኘት አይችልም፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት የኮርፓስ እና የዶሜን ቋንቋ ያላገኘውን የሮፓስቲ አካባቢ እና የዶሜን ቃላት ያላገኘውን የሮፓስቲ አካባቢ እና የግልፅ ትርጓሜን በመጠቀም የረኀብ አካባቢ ማድረግ በመጠቀም ይሞላል፡፡ Advantages of TopWORDS-Seg are demonstrated by a series of experimental studies.', 'tr': 'A챌캇k domena 횉in 챌e metinleri i힊lemek on y캇llard캇r hesaplan챌 lingwistiklerinde 철r채n k철t체 bir 힊ekilde 챌철z체ldir. 횉체nk체 metin segmentasyonu we s철zlerini bu 챌철z체mli senaryoda bir-birine bu 챌철z체mli senaryda birbirini birbirine bir araya getiril첵채r. Hi챌 bir bar y철ntem heniz t채sirli metin segmentasyny we s철zlerni a챌mak 체챌in 첵etip bilmez. Bu ara힊dyrma Bayesian hasaplamagyna da첵an첵an, TopWORDS-Seg adlanan nowel y철ntemi dolduryp bu gapy doldur첵ar. Ha챌and a korpus we domena s철zleri흫 ulagany 첵ok wagtynda 첵igren챌 t채sir we t채sirli terjime etm채ge lezzet al첵ar. TopWORDS-Seg sanyny흫 철n체힊leri birn채챌e experimental araplary tarapyndan g철rkezil첵채r.', 'hy': 'Համակարգչային լեզվաբանության մեջ բաց բնագավառ չինական տեքստերի վերլուծումը տասնամյակների ընթացքում կարևոր խոչընդոտ է եղել, մասամբ այն պատճառով, որ տեքստի սեգմետրացիան և բառերի հայտնագործումը հաճախ կապված են միմյանց հետ այս դ Ոչ մի գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդ դեռևս չի կարող արդյունավետ տեքստի սեգմետրացիա և բառերի բացահայտում միաժամանակ բաց տիեզերքում: Այս ուսումնասիրությունը լրացնում է այս տարբերությունը առաջարկելով TopWords-SEG կոչվող նոր մեթոդ, որը հիմնված է Բեյզիայի եզրակացության վրա, որը հաճույք ունի ուժեղ ներկայացման և թափանցիկ ինտերպրեկցիայի վրա, երբ ոչ մի վարժեցման կորպուս Advantages of TopWORDS-Seg are demonstrated by a series of experimental studies.', 'az': "Açıq-domani Çin metinlərini işlədirmək on illərdir ki, hesap dilində kritik bir çətinlikdir, çünki mətn segmentasiyası və sözlərin keşfini bu çətinlikli scenariyada çox çox bir-birinə qarışır. Heç bir mövcud yolu hələ də faydalı metin segmentasiyasını və sözlərin keşfetməsini açıq domeində başa verə bilməz. Bu təhsil bu boşluğu, Bayesian infeksiyasına dayanan TopWORDS-Seg adlı yeni metodları təklif edərək doldurur, çünki heç bir təhsil korpusu və domenin sözləri faydalanmadığı zaman güclü təhsil və aydın təfsil istifadəsindən faydalanır. TopWORDS-Seg'in tədbirləri bir seri təhsil təhsil sayəsində göstərilir.", 'bn': 'কয়েক দশক ধরে খোলা ডোমেইনের টেক্সট প্রক্রিয়া এক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বোতলেন্কের প্রক্রিয়া হয়েছে, অংশের কারণ এই চ্যালেঞ্জের দৃশ্যে টেক্সট বিভক্ত এবং শব্দ কোনো বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি এখনো কার্যকর টেক্সট বিভক্তি এবং শব্দটি একই সাথে খোলা ডোমেইনে আবিষ্কার করতে পারে না। এই গবেষণার মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে বেয়েশিয়ার সংক্রান্ত ভিত্তিতে টোপওয়ার্ডস-সেগ নামের একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করে, যা কোন প্রশিক্ষণ ও ডোমেইন শব্দভাণ্ডার প কয়েকটি পরীক্ষা গবেষণা দ্বারা টোপওয়ার্ডস-সেগের উন্নয়ন প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Procesiranje otvorenog domena kineskih tekstova već desetljećima je kritično opterećeno u računalnoj lingvistiki, djelomično zato što segmentacija teksta i otkrivanje riječi često se uključuju međusobno u ovom izazovnom scenariju. Nijedna postojeća metoda još ne može postići efikasna segmentacija teksta i otkrivanje riječi istovremeno u otvorenom domenu. Ova istraživanja ispunjava taj praznik predloživši novu metodu pod nazivom TopWORDS-Seg baziranu na inferenciji Bayesija, koja uživa u robnoj funkciji i transparentnoj interpretaciji kada nema slobodnog korpusa i ročnika domena. Prednosti TopWORDS-Seg pokazuju niz eksperimentalnih ispitivanja.', 'ca': "Procesar textos xinesos de domini obert ha estat un bloc crític en la llengüística computacional durant dècades, en part perquè la segmentació del text i el descobriment de paraules sovint s'involucren entre elles en aquest escenari desafiant. Encara no hi ha mètodes que puguin aconseguir segmentació efectiva del text i descobriment de paraules simultàneament en domini obert. Aquest estudi omple aquest buit proposant un mètode nou anomenat TopWORDS-Seg basat en la inferència bayèsia, que gaudi d'un rendiment robust i d'una interpretació transparent quan no hi ha vocabulari d'entrenament i domini disponibles. Els avantatges de TopWORDS-Seg es demostren per una sèrie d'estudis experimentals.", 'cs': 'Zpracování čínských textů s otevřenou doménou bylo kritickým úzkým místem ve výpočetní lingvistice po desetiletí, částečně proto, že segmentace textu a objevování slov se v tomto náročném scénáři často proplétají. Žádné existující metody dosud nedokážou dosáhnout efektivní segmentace textu a zjišťování slov současně v otevřené doméně. Tato studie tuto mezeru vyplňuje navržením nové metody TopWORDS-Seg založené na Bayesovské inferenci, která má robustní výkon a transparentní interpretaci, když nejsou k dispozici žádné tréninkové korpusy a doménové slovní zásoby. Výhody TopWORDS-Segu jsou demonstrovány řadou experimentálních studií.', 'et': 'Avatud hiina tekstide töötlemine on olnud arvutuslingvistikas juba aastakümneid kriitiliseks kitsaskohaks, osaliselt seetõttu, et teksti segmenteerimine ja sõna avastamine on selles keerulises stsenaariumis tihti omavahel seotud. Ükski olemasolev meetod ei suuda saavutada tõhusat teksti segmenteerimist ja sõna avastamist üheaegselt avatud domeenis. Käesolev uuring täidab selle lünga, pakkudes välja uudse meetodi nimega TopWORDS-Seg, mis põhineb Bayesi järeldusel, mis naudib tugevat jõudlust ja läbipaistvat tõlgendamist, kui koolituskorpust ja domeenisõnavara puuduvad. TopWORDS-Seg eeliseid tõendavad mitmed eksperimentaalsed uuringud.', 'fi': 'Avoimen verkkotunnuksen kiinalaisten tekstien käsittely on ollut laskennallisen kielitieteen kriittinen pullonkaula vuosikymmenten ajan osittain siksi, että tekstin segmentointi ja sanahaku kietoutuvat usein toisiinsa tässä haastavassa skenaariossa. Mikään olemassa oleva menetelmä ei vielä pysty saavuttamaan tehokasta tekstin segmentointia ja sanan etsintää samanaikaisesti avoimessa verkkotunnuksessa. Tämä tutkimus täyttää tämän aukon ehdottamalla uutta bayesilaiseen päättelyyn perustuvaa TopWORDS-Seg-menetelmää, joka nauttii vankasta suorituskyvystä ja läpinäkyvästä tulkinnasta, kun koulutuscorpusta ja sanastoa ei ole saatavilla. TopWORDS-Segin edut on osoitettu useissa kokeellisissa tutkimuksissa.', 'jv': 'Ngawe No current Methods heno can success Effect text segmentation and word detecty at the same time in open domain. This tutorial fills in this gap by proposal a rom method used as top Words-seg basic on bayesi an installation, that gêrnês bot play and traverse interjection when no Learning Body and domain Vocationêr are available. Mawih Advantage ning top WWords-segment diputara diputara karo akeh basa sing ujaran.', 'he': 'מעבדת טקסטים סיניים בתחום פתוח הייתה בקבוק קריטי בלשון מחשבי במשך עשרות שנים, חלקית בגלל שחלקת טקסט וגילוי מילים לעתים קרובות מתערבות אחד עם השני בתרחיש המתגיד הזה. שום שיטות קיימות עדיין לא יכולות להשיג סגמנציה טקסטית יעילה וגילוי מילים באותו הזמן בתחום פתוח. מחקר זה ממלא את הפער הזה על ידי הצעה שיטה רומנית שנקראת TopWORDS-Seg מבוססת על המסקנה Bayesian, אשר נהנה ביצועים חזקים ופרשנות שקופה כאשר אין קורפוס אימון ולספר מילים של שטח זמין. יתרונות של TopWORDS-Seg מוצגות על ידי סדרה של מחקרים ניסויים.', 'sk': 'Obdelava kitajskih besedil z odprto domeno je že desetletja kritično ozko grlo v računalniškem jezikoslovju, delno zato, ker se segmentacija besedila in odkrivanje besed v tem zahtevnem scenariju pogosto prepletata. Nobena obstoječa metoda še ne more doseči učinkovite segmentacije besedila in iskanja besed hkrati v odprti domeni. Ta študija zapolni to vrzel s predlogom nove metode TopWORDS-Seg, ki temelji na bajzijskih sklepih, ki uživa robustno zmogljivost in pregledno interpretacijo, ko ni na voljo nobenega korpusa usposabljanja in domenskega besedišča. Prednosti TopWORDS-Seg so dokazane s serijo eksperimentalnih študij.', 'ha': "QFontDatabase Babu wasu shiryoyin da ke gaba, ba za su iya isa raba sigarin matsayi mai amfani ba, da kuma za'a gane magana sami guda cikin guda da ake buɗe. Wannan littafin da ke cika cikin wannan gap da ya buƙata wani metode na novel a wanda aka yi jina TopWORDS-Seg a kan kwamfyutan Bayesian kafin, wanda yana yarda da gyaran raɗabi'a da fassarar bayyane idan ba za'a iya sãmu da tsarin nau'in da tsarin dam ba. An nuna masu gabatar da shirin tsumarni na TopWORDS-Seg.", 'bo': 'Processing open-domain Chinese texts has been a critical bottleneck in computational linguistics for decades, partially because text segmentation and word discovery often entangle with each other in this challenging scenario. No existing methods yet can achieve effective text segmentation and word discovery simultaneously in open domain. This study fills in this gap by proposing a novel method called TopWORDS-Seg based on Bayesian inference, which enjoys robust performance and transparent interpretation when no training corpus and domain vocabulary are available. Advantages of TopWORDS-Seg are demonstrated by a series of experimental studies.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'نموذج متعدد المهام ومتعدد المعلمين غير خاضع للإشراف للتعرف على الكيانات المسماة عبر اللغات', 'pt': 'Um modelo não supervisionado de várias tarefas e vários professores para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada em vários idiomas', 'es': 'Un modelo no supervisado de tareas múltiples y maestros múltiples para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas en varios idiomas', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルな名前付きエンティティ認識のための、監督されていないマルチタスクとマルチティーチャーモデル', 'fr': "Un modèle non supervisé à tâches multiples et à enseignants multiples pour la reconnaissance multilingue d'entités nommées", 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल नामित एंटिटी पहचान के लिए एक असुरक्षित एकाधिक-कार्य और एकाधिक-शिक्षक मॉडल', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемая многозадачная и многоучительная модель для межъязыкового распознавания именованных сущностей', 'zh': '一以跨言名实体识者无监督多任务多师模形', 'ga': 'Samhail Ilthasc agus Ilmhúinteora gan Mhaoirseacht le haghaidh Aitheantas Trastheangach Aonán Ainmnithe', 'ka': 'მრავალური რაოდენობები და მრავალური სწავლებელი მოდელიName', 'el': 'Ένα μη εποπτευμένο μοντέλο πολλαπλών εργασιών και πολλαπλών δασκάλων για την αναγνώριση γλωσσικών ονομάτων οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'Felügyelet nélküli többfeladatú és többtanáros modell a többnyelvű nevezett entitás felismeréséhez', 'it': 'Un modello non supervisionato per il riconoscimento multilingue delle entità denominate', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілді аталған нысандардың бірнеше тапсырмалар мен бірнеше ұстаздар үлгісі', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas daugiakalbio ir daugiakalbio subjekto pripažinimo modelis', 'mk': 'Ненадгледуван модел на многутрашни задачи и многутрашни учители за крстојачно препознавање именувани ентитети', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷക്കു് പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു അധിക ജോലിയും പല- ടീച്ചര്\u200d മോഡലും', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Kompiti Multipli u Mgħalliema Multipli Mhux Sorveljat għar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija b’Ismijiet Cross-Lingwi', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэл нэрлэгдсэн бүтээгдэхүүний олон ажил болон олон багш нарын загвар', 'no': 'Ein ikkje-oppretta fleire oppgåver og fleire lærarar-modell for krysspråkskjenning av namnet eininga', 'pl': 'Nienadzorowany model wielozadaniowy i wielozadaniowy dla wielojęzycznego rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów', 'sr': 'Neodređen model višestrukog zadatka i višestrukog učitelja za prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanih entiteta', 'ro': 'Un model nesupravegheat cu activități multiple și profesori multipli pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite în mai multe limbi', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවක් නම් කිරීම් අයිතික අඳුරගන්න ගොඩක් වැඩි කාර්ය සහ ගොඩක් ගුරුවර් මොඩේල්', 'so': 'Maamul-Maamul-Macallin oo aan ilaalinayn', 'ta': 'An Unsupervised Multiple-Task and Multiple-Teacher Model for Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'sv': 'En icke övervakad modell för flerspråkig namngiven enhet med flera uppgifter och flera lärare', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một cách điện đã không giám tập nhiệm và một sự giác đã giải phòng tên nó xuyên mật', 'bg': 'Модел с няколко задачи и няколко учители без надзор за разпознаване на междуезични имена на субекти', 'hr': 'Neodređen model višestrukih zadataka i višestrukih učitelja za prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanih podataka', 'nl': 'Een niet-begeleid model voor meervoudige taken en meervoudige leraren voor meertalige naamsbekendheid', 'da': 'En ikke-overvåget model med flere opgaver og flere lærere til genkendelse af navngivne enheder på tværs af sprog', 'de': 'Ein unbeaufsichtigtes Mehraufgaben- und Mehrlehrermodell zur sprachübergreifenden Erkennung benannter Entitäten', 'fa': 'یک مدل بسیاری از کار و مدل بسیاری از معلم برای شناسایی واحد نامیده شده از زبان\u200cهای متوسط', 'ko': '다중 언어 명명 실체 식별의 무감독 다중 임무 다중 교사 모델', 'id': 'An Unsupervised Multiple-Task and Multiple-Teacher Model for Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Masuala ya Kimbalimbali na Kilimu wa Kimbalimbali kwa Utambulisho wa Kirusi kinachoitwa', 'tr': 'Çot-dilli Adlanylan Bir Taýram we Çot-Mugallymçy nusgasy', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Multi-Teacher Model for Cross-language Entity Recognition', 'hy': 'An Unsupervised Multiple-Task and Multiple-Teacher Model for Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition', 'az': 'Daha çox dilli Adlı Entity Recognition üçün Əlavə edilməmiş çox-Task və çox-Müəllimlər Modeli', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Neodređen model višestrukog zadatka i višestrukog učitelja za prepoznavanje preko jezika imenovanih entiteta', 'ca': "Un model de múltiples tasques i mestres sense supervisió per a la reconeixement d'una entitat anomenada en llenguatges", 'cs': 'Nekontrolovaný model více úkolů a více učitelů pro rozpoznávání více jazyků jmenovaných entit', 'et': 'Järelevalveta mitme ülesande ja mitme õpetaja mudel keeleülese nimega üksuse tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Valvontaton useiden tehtävien ja useiden opettajien malli monikielisen nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamista varten', 'sq': 'Një model me shumë detyra dhe mësues të shumtë pa mbikqyrje për njohjen ndërgjuhësore të njësisë me emër', 'sk': 'Model za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov z več opravili in več učiteljev brez nadzora', 'jv': 'Multiple-tasks lan Multiple-Learnr model kanggo krus-language Named Ention', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'מודל של משימות רבות ולמורים רבים ללא השגחה', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual Named Entity Recognition'}
{'en': 'Tables store rich numerical data, but numerical reasoning over tables is still a challenge. In this paper, we find that the spreadsheet formula, a commonly used language to perform computations on numerical values in spreadsheets, is a valuable supervision for numerical reasoning in tables. Considering large amounts of spreadsheets available on the web, we propose FORTAP, the first exploration to leverage spreadsheet formulas for table pretraining. Two novel self-supervised pretraining objectives are derived from formulas, numerical reference prediction (NRP) and numerical calculation prediction (NCP). While our proposed objectives are generic for encoders, to better capture spreadsheet table layouts and structures, FORTAP is built upon TUTA, the first transformer-based method for spreadsheet table pretraining with tree attention. FORTAP outperforms state-of-the-art methods by large margins on three representative datasets of formula prediction, question answering, and cell type classification, showing the great potential of leveraging formulas for table pretraining.', 'ar': 'تعد مهمة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة عبر اللغات واحدة من المشكلات الحاسمة لتقييم تقنيات تعلم النقل المحتملة على اللغات منخفضة الموارد. أظهر تقطير المعرفة باستخدام نماذج لغة متعددة اللغات مدربة مسبقًا بين لغات المصدر والهدف تفوقها في النقل. ومع ذلك ، فإن نماذج التقطير عبر اللغات الحالية تنظر فقط في إمكانية النقل المحتملة بين مهمتين فرديتين متطابقتين عبر كلا المجالين. لم يتم التحقيق بشكل كامل في المهام المساعدة المحتملة الأخرى لتحسين أداء التعلم. في هذه الدراسة ، استنادًا إلى إطار عمل تقطير المعرفة والتعلم متعدد المهام ، نقدم نموذج قياس التشابه كمهمة مساعدة لتحسين أداء NER متعدد اللغات في المجال المستهدف. على وجه التحديد ، يتم تدريب أداة التعرف على الكيانات ومقيم التشابه أولاً بالتوازي كمعلمين من المجال المصدر. بعد ذلك ، يتم الإشراف على مهمتين في نموذج الطالب في وقت واحد من قبل هؤلاء المعلمين. تؤكد الدراسات التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات الثلاث عبر 7 لغات مختلفة فعالية النموذج المقترح.', 'fr': "La tâche de reconnaissance d'entités nommées multilingues est l'un des problèmes critiques pour évaluer les techniques d'apprentissage par transfert potentielles sur les langues à faibles ressources. La distillation des connaissances à l'aide de modèles linguistiques multilingues pré-entraînés entre les langues source et cible a démontré sa supériorité en matière de transfert. Cependant, les modèles de distillation interlinguale existants tiennent simplement compte de la transférabilité potentielle entre deux tâches uniques identiques dans les deux domaines. D'autres tâches auxiliaires possibles pour améliorer les performances d'apprentissage n'ont pas été pleinement étudiées. Dans cette étude, basée sur le framework de distillation des connaissances et l'apprentissage multitâche, nous introduisons le modèle de métrique de similarité comme tâche auxiliaire pour améliorer les performances NER multilingues sur le domaine cible. Plus précisément, un outil de reconnaissance d'entité et un évaluateur de similarité sont d'abord formés en parallèle en tant que deux enseignants du domaine source. Ensuite, deux tâches du modèle étudiant sont supervisées simultanément par ces professeurs. Des études empiriques sur les trois ensembles de données dans 7 langues différentes confirment l'efficacité du modèle proposé.", 'es': 'La tarea de reconocimiento de entidades con nombre multilingüe es uno de los problemas críticos para evaluar las posibles técnicas de aprendizaje por transferencia en idiomas de escasos recursos. La destilación del conocimiento mediante modelos lingüísticos multilingües previamente entrenados entre los idiomas de origen y de destino ha demostrado su superioridad en la transferencia. Sin embargo, los modelos de destilación interlingüística existentes simplemente consideran la posible transferibilidad entre dos tareas individuales idénticas en ambos dominios. Otras posibles tareas auxiliares para mejorar el rendimiento del aprendizaje no se han investigado a fondo. En este estudio, basado en el marco de destilación de conocimientos y el aprendizaje multitarea, presentamos el modelo de métrica de similitud como una tarea auxiliar para mejorar el rendimiento de NER multilingüe en el dominio objetivo. Específicamente, un reconocedor de entidades y un evaluador de similitudes se capacitan primero en paralelo como dos profesores del dominio fuente. Luego, dos tareas en el modelo de estudiante son supervisadas por estos profesores simultáneamente. Los estudios empíricos sobre los tres conjuntos de datos en 7 idiomas diferentes confirman la eficacia del modelo propuesto.', 'pt': 'A tarefa de reconhecimento de entidade nomeada multilíngue é um dos problemas críticos para avaliar as técnicas de aprendizado de transferência em potencial em idiomas com poucos recursos. A destilação do conhecimento usando modelos de idiomas multilíngues pré-treinados entre os idiomas de origem e de destino mostrou sua superioridade na transferência. No entanto, os modelos existentes de destilação multilíngue consideram apenas a possibilidade de transferência entre duas tarefas únicas idênticas em ambos os domínios. Outras possíveis tarefas auxiliares para melhorar o desempenho da aprendizagem não foram totalmente investigadas. Neste estudo, com base no framework de destilação de conhecimento e aprendizagem multitarefa, introduzimos o modelo métrico de similaridade como uma tarefa auxiliar para melhorar o desempenho do NER multilíngue no domínio alvo. Especificamente, um reconhecedor de entidade e um avaliador de similaridade são primeiro treinados em paralelo como dois professores do domínio de origem. Em seguida, duas tarefas no modelo de aluno são supervisionadas por esses professores simultaneamente. Estudos empíricos sobre os três conjuntos de dados em 7 idiomas diferentes confirmam a eficácia do modelo proposto.', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルの名前付きエンティティ認識タスクは、低リソース言語での潜在的な転送学習テクニックを評価するための重要な問題の1つです。 ソース言語とターゲット言語間の事前にトレーニングされた多言語モデルを使用した知識蒸留は、転送における優位性を示しています。 しかし、既存のクロスリンガル蒸留モデルは、両方のドメインにわたる2つの同一の単一のタスク間の潜在的な移転可能性を考慮するだけである。 学習パフォーマンスを向上させるために考えられる他の補助的なタスクは、完全には調査されていない。 この研究では、知識蒸留フレームワークとマルチタスク学習に基づいて、ターゲットドメインのクロスリンガルNERパフォーマンスを改善するための補助的なタスクとして類似性メトリックモデルを導入します。 具体的には、エンティティ認識ツールと類似性評価ツールは、まずソースドメインから2人の教師として並行してトレーニングされます。 次に、学習者モデルの2つの課題は、これらの教師によって同時に監督されます。 7つの異なる言語にわたる3つのデータセットに関する実証研究は、提案されたモデルの有効性を確認している。', 'zh': '跨言名实体,评估卑资言之关键问题一也。 语言语言之间,用预训者多言模蒸馏,已见其传输之美。 然今之跨语蒸馏模则惟两域之同者潜于可转移性。 其他佐命以崇学习成绩未尽究也。 本研本于知识提炼框架与多任务学,引入相似度量模样以为辅助,高其域之跨言NER性能。 实体识别器与相似性评估器首为源域师并行训练。 然后弟子模形中的两个职务是一时监督。 7异言者3数集证有效性。', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी नामित इकाई मान्यता कार्य कम संसाधन भाषाओं पर संभावित हस्तांतरण सीखने की तकनीकों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण समस्याओं में से एक है। स्रोत और लक्ष्य भाषाओं के बीच पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित बहुभाषी भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करके ज्ञान आसवन ने हस्तांतरण में अपनी श्रेष्ठता दिखाई है। हालांकि, मौजूदा क्रॉस-लिंगुअल आसवन मॉडल केवल दोनों डोमेन में दो समान एकल कार्यों के बीच संभावित हस्तांतरणीयता पर विचार करते हैं। सीखने के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए अन्य संभावित सहायक कार्यों की पूरी तरह से जांच नहीं की गई है। इस अध्ययन में, ज्ञान आसवन ढांचे और बहु-कार्य सीखने के आधार पर, हम लक्ष्य डोमेन पर क्रॉस-लिंगुअल एनईआर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए एक सहायक कार्य के रूप में समानता मीट्रिक मॉडल पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, एक इकाई पहचानकर्ता और एक समानता मूल्यांकनकर्ता को पहले स्रोत डोमेन से दो शिक्षकों के रूप में समानांतर में प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। फिर, छात्र मॉडल में दो कार्यों को इन शिक्षकों द्वारा एक साथ पर्यवेक्षण किया जाता है। 7 अलग-अलग भाषाओं में तीन डेटासेट पर अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन प्रस्तावित मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता की पुष्टि करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Межязычная задача распознавания именованных сущностей является одной из критических проблем для оценки потенциальных методов обучения передаче на языках с низким уровнем ресурсов. Дистилляция знаний с использованием предварительно обученных многоязычных языковых моделей между исходными и целевыми языками показала их превосходство в передаче. Тем не менее, существующие межязыковые модели дистилляции просто учитывают потенциальную возможность переноса между двумя идентичными одиночными задачами в обеих областях. Другие возможные вспомогательные задачи по повышению эффективности обучения не были полностью исследованы. В этом исследовании, основанном на структуре дистилляции знаний и многозадачном обучении, мы вводим метрическую модель сходства в качестве вспомогательной задачи для улучшения межъязыковой производительности NER в целевой области. В частности, распознаватель сущностей и оценщик сходства сначала обучаются параллельно в качестве двух преподавателей из исходного домена. Затем две задачи в студенческой модели контролируются этими преподавателями одновременно. Эмпирические исследования трех наборов данных на 7 разных языках подтверждают эффективность предлагаемой модели.', 'ga': 'Tá tasc aitheantais tras-teangach aonáin ainmnithe ar cheann de na fadhbanna ríthábhachtacha chun teicnící foghlama aistrithe féideartha ar theangacha íseal-acmhainne a mheas. Léiríonn driogadh eolais agus úsáid á baint as samhlacha teanga ilteangacha réamhoilte idir foinse agus sprioctheangacha a fheabhas is atá siad san aistriú. Ní bhreithníonn samhlacha driogtha trasteangacha atá ann faoi láthair, áfach, ach an inaistritheacht fhéideartha idir dhá thasc aonair chomhionanna thar an dá réimse. Níl imscrúdú iomlán déanta ar thascanna cúnta eile a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann chun an fheidhmíocht foghlama a fheabhsú. Sa staidéar seo, bunaithe ar an gcreat driogtha eolais agus ar fhoghlaim ilthasc, tugaimid isteach an tsamhail mhéadrach cosúlachta mar thasc cúnta chun feidhmíocht NER tras-teangach ar an spriocfhearann a fheabhsú. Go sonrach, cuirtear oiliúint chomhthreomhar ar dtús ar aitheantas aonáin agus ar mheastóir cosúlachta mar bheirt mhúinteoirí ón bhfearann foinse. Ansin, déanann na múinteoirí seo maoirseacht ar dhá thasc i múnla na mac léinn go comhuaineach. Deimhníonn staidéir eimpíreacha ar na trí thacar sonraí thar 7 dteanga dhifriúla éifeachtacht na samhla molta.', 'el': 'Η διεθνής εργασία αναγνώρισης ονομασίας οντότητας είναι ένα από τα κρίσιμα προβλήματα για την αξιολόγηση των πιθανών τεχνικών μάθησης μεταφοράς σε γλώσσες χαμηλού πόρου. Η απόσταξη γνώσεων χρησιμοποιώντας προ-εκπαιδευμένα πολύγλωσσα μοντέλα γλωσσών μεταξύ γλωσσών προέλευσης και προορισμού έδειξαν την υπεροχή τους στη μεταφορά. Ωστόσο, τα υπάρχοντα διγλωσσικά μοντέλα απόσταξης απλώς εξετάζουν την πιθανή δυνατότητα μεταφοράς μεταξύ δύο πανομοιότυπων μεμονωμένων εργασιών και των δύο τομέων. Άλλες πιθανές βοηθητικές εργασίες για τη βελτίωση της μαθησιακής απόδοσης δεν έχουν διερευνηθεί πλήρως. Στην παρούσα μελέτη, με βάση το πλαίσιο απόσταξης γνώσης και την εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών, εισάγουμε το μετρικό μοντέλο ομοιότητας ως βοηθητικό έργο για τη βελτίωση της γλωσσικής απόδοσης στον τομέα-στόχο. Συγκεκριμένα, ένας αναγνωριστής οντότητας και ένας αξιολογητής ομοιότητας εκπαιδεύονται πρώτα παράλληλα ως δύο εκπαιδευτικοί από τον τομέα προέλευσης. Στη συνέχεια, δύο εργασίες στο μοντέλο των μαθητών εποπτεύονται από αυτούς τους εκπαιδευτικούς ταυτόχρονα. Εμπειριακές μελέτες για τα τρία σύνολα δεδομένων σε επτά διαφορετικές γλώσσες επιβεβαιώνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű elnevezésű entitás felismerési feladat az egyik kritikus probléma az alacsony erőforrású nyelveken történő lehetséges transzfertanulási technikák értékelésében. A forrás- és célnyelvek közötti, előzetesen képzett többnyelvű nyelvi modelleket alkalmazó tudásdesztilláció bizonyította, hogy a transzfer során felsőbbrendű. A meglévő, többnyelvű desztillációs modellek azonban csupán azt vizsgálják, hogy két azonos feladat közötti lehetséges átvihetőség mindkét területen át történik. A tanulási teljesítmény javítását célzó egyéb lehetséges kiegészítő feladatokat nem vizsgálták teljes mértékben. Jelen tanulmányban a tudás desztillációs keretrendszer és a többfeladatos tanulás alapján bemutatjuk a hasonlósági metrikus modellt, mint kiegészítő feladatot a céltartományon a többnyelvű NER teljesítmény javítására. Konkrétan egy entitás felismerőjét és egy hasonlóság-értékelőt először párhuzamosan képezik két tanárként a forrástartományból. Ezután a diákmodell két feladatát egyidejűleg ezek a tanárok felügyelik. A három adathalmaz hét különböző nyelven végzett empirikus tanulmányai megerősítik a javasolt modell hatékonyságát.', 'ka': 'ძირითადი ინტერნეტის უცნობის რაოდენობა არის ერთი კრიტიკური პრობლემების შესახებ პრობლემების შესახებ პრობლემენტის შესახებ შესახებ ტექნექტიკ მეცნიერების დისტლილიაცია, რომელიც მრავალური ენის მოდელების გამოყენებაც გამოყენებული მრავალური ენის მოდელების გამოყენებაში გამოყენებულია სამუშაო ენების შ მაგრამ მხოლოდ, მსგავსი კრიცენგური დისტლილიაციის მოდელები უკვე აღმოჩნეთ პროცენტალური გადატანაცია ორი იდენტიკალური ერთი დავალების შორის. სხვა შესაძლებელი დახმარებელი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სა ამ კვლევაში, მეცნიერების დისტლილიაციის ფრამეტზე და მრავალური დასწავლობაზე, ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ სხვადასხვა მეტრიკური მოდელს როგორც დახმარებელი დავალება, რომ გაუფლებოთ მრავალური NER პროცესტის განსაკუთრებულია, ინტერტის განახლებელი და სხვადასხვა განახლებელი პირველი პერალელად განახლებიან, როგორც ორი მასწავლებელი მსწავლებელია მსწავლებელად. შემდეგ, სტუდენტის მოდელში ორი დავალება ამ სტუდენტებს ერთადერთად დანახვა. სამი მონაცემების შესახებ 7 განსხვავებული ენების განსხვავებაში იმპერიკალური კვლევები დააწყებენ მონაცემების ეფექტიურობა.', 'it': "L'attività cross-lingual named entity recognition è uno dei problemi critici per valutare le potenziali tecniche di apprendimento di trasferimento su lingue a basso contenuto di risorse. La distillazione delle conoscenze utilizzando modelli linguistici multilingui pre-formati tra lingue di origine e di destinazione ha dimostrato la loro superiorità nel trasferimento. Tuttavia, i modelli di distillazione multilingue esistenti considerano semplicemente la potenziale trasferibilità tra due singoli compiti identici in entrambi i settori. Altri possibili compiti ausiliari per migliorare le prestazioni di apprendimento non sono stati approfonditi. In questo studio, basato sul framework di distillazione della conoscenza e sull'apprendimento multi-task, introduciamo il modello metrico di somiglianza come compito ausiliario per migliorare le prestazioni cross-lingual NER sul dominio target. Nello specifico, un identificatore di entità e un valutatore di somiglianza vengono prima formati in parallelo come due insegnanti del dominio sorgente. Poi, due compiti nel modello studentesco sono supervisionati da questi insegnanti contemporaneamente. Studi empirici sui tre set di dati in 7 lingue diverse confermano l'efficacia del modello proposto.", 'lt': 'Tarpkalbis pavadintas subjekto pripažinimo uždavinys yra viena iš svarbiausių problemų vertinant galimus mokymosi technologijų perdavimą mažai išteklių turinčiomis kalbomis. Žinių distiliavimas naudojant iš anksto apmokytus daugiakalbius modelius tarp šaltinio ir tikslinių kalbų parodė, kad jų perdavimas yra didesnis. Tačiau esamuose tarpkalbiniuose distiliavimo modeliuose atsižvelgiama tik į galimą dviejų vienodų užduočių perkeliamumą abiejose srityse. Kitos galimos pagalbinės užduotys mokymosi rezultatams gerinti nebuvo išsamiai ištirtos. Šiame tyrime, pagrįstame žinių distiliavimo sistema ir daugiafunkciniu mokymusi, panašumo metrinis modelis įvedamas kaip pagalbinė užduotis gerinti tarpkalbinį NER veiksmingumą tikslinėje srityje. Konkrečiai, subjekto pripažintojas ir panašumo vertintojas pirmą kartą mokomi lygiagrečiai kaip du iš šaltinio srities mokytojai. Tada šie mokytojai vienu metu prižiūri dvi student ų modelio užduotis. Empiriniai trijų duomenų rinkinių tyrimai 7 skirtingose kalbose patvirtina siūlomo modelio veiksmingumą.', 'kk': 'Төменгі тілдер аталған нысандарды анықтау тапсырмасы - ресурс тілдерінде алу мүмкіндікті оқыту техникаларын бағалау үшін маңызды мәселелердің бірі. Көзі мен мақсатты тілдер арасындағы көп тіл үлгілерін алдын- ала оқылған білім дисплейлері өзінің көп тіл үлгілерін тасымалдауға болады. Бірақ, бірнеше тілді дистриляциялау үлгілері тек екі доменде бір бір тапсырма арасындағы мүмкіндік аударылығын қалайды. Оқыту мүмкіндігін жақсарту үшін басқа көмектесу тапсырмалары толық зерттеулі емес. Бұл зерттеулерде, білім дистилациялау фрейміне негізделген және көп тапсырмаларды оқытуға негізделген, біз мәселелердің метрикалық моделін мақсатты доменге көмектесу үшін көмектесу тапсырмасы ретін Сәйкес, нысандарды анықтаушы мен ұқсас бағалаушысы алғашқы ретінде, көзінің доменіндегі екі ұстаздар ретінде оқылған. Содан кейін студенттер үлгісіндегі екі тапсырма бір-бір ұстаздардың басқаруы болады. 7 түрлі тілдерде үш деректер қорларының империялық зерттеулері келтірілген үлгісінің эффективнігін тексереді.', 'mk': 'Работата за препознавање на ентитетите, наречена прекујазично, е еден од критичните проблеми за проценка на потенцијалните техники за пренесување на учење на јазици со ниски ресурси. Дистилацијата на знаење користејќи предобучени мултијазични модели помеѓу изворните и метните јазици покажа нивна супериорност во трансферот. Сепак, постојните модели за прекујазична дистилација само ја сметаат потенцијалната трансферентност помеѓу две идентични единствени задачи во двете домени. Другите можни помошни задачи за подобрување на учењето не се целосно испитани. Во оваа студија, врз основа на рамката за дистилација на знаење и учење на мултизадачи, го воведуваме метричкиот модел на сличност како помошна задача за подобрување на прекујазичната резултатност на НЕР во доменот на целта. Специфично, препознавач на ентитетите и евалуатор на сличност се првпат обучени паралелно како двајца професори од доменот на изворот. Потоа, две задачи во студентскиот модел се надгледувани од овие учители истовремено. Империските студии на трите податоци низ 7 различни јазици ја потврдуваат ефикасноста на предложениот модел.', 'ms': 'Cross-lingual named entity recognition task is one of the critical problems for evaluating the potential transfer learning techniques on low resource languages.  Pengesahan pengetahuan menggunakan model bahasa berbilang-bahasa terlatih di antara bahasa sumber dan sasaran telah menunjukkan kelebihan mereka dalam pemindahan. Namun, model pencucian saling bahasa yang wujud hanya mempertimbangkan kemungkinan pemindahan antara dua tugas tunggal yang sama di seluruh kedua-dua domain. Tugas bantuan lain yang mungkin untuk meningkatkan prestasi pembelajaran belum diselesaikan sepenuhnya. Dalam kajian ini, berdasarkan kerangka pengusiran pengetahuan dan pembelajaran multi-tugas, kami memperkenalkan model metrik persamaan sebagai tugas bantuan untuk meningkatkan prestasi NER salib bahasa pada domain sasaran. Secara khusus, pengenali entiti dan penilai persamaan terlatih pertama dalam selari sebagai dua guru dari domain sumber. Kemudian, dua tugas dalam model pelajar diawasi oleh guru-guru ini secara bersamaan. kajian empirik pada tiga set data melalui 7 bahasa yang berbeza mengesahkan keefektivitas model yang diusulkan.', 'ml': 'സാധ്യതയുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ക്രോസ്- ലാങ്കുകള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷകളിലെ പഠിപ്പിനുള്ള സാധ്യതകള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിനു Knowledge distillation using pre-trained multilingual language models between source and target languages have shown their superiority in transfer.  എന്നാലും, നിലവിലുള്ള ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡൊമെയിനുകള്\u200dക്കും രണ്ട് പോലെയുള്ള ഒരേ ജോല പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള മറ്റു ജോലികള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും അന്വേഷ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d, അറിവുകള്\u200d വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്കും പല ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ് ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെയിനിലെ ക്രിസ്ലി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നവനും ഒരു തുല്യമായ വിലാസിക്കുന്നവനും ആദ്യം സ്രോതസ്സ് ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d നിന എന്നിട്ട്, വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികളുടെ മോഡലിലെ രണ്ട് ജോലികള്\u200d ഒരേ സമയത്ത് ഈ ടീച്ചര്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. 7 വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലുള്ള മൂന്നു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ എമിരിക്കല്\u200d പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട', 'mn': 'Ингэснээр нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийн танихын тулд олон хэл хэлний сургалтын технологийг бага боловсролын хэл дээр шилжүүлэх боломжтой асуудлуудын нэг нь чухал асуудал юм. Өмнөх болон зорилготой хэлний хооронд сургалтын олон хэл загваруудыг ашиглан мэдлэгтэй хуваалцах нь өөрсдийгөө илүү өндөр шилжүүлэхэд харуулсан. Гэхдээ хэлний тусгаарлах загварууд зөвхөн хоёр дахь адил нэг үйл ажиллагааны хоорондын тусгаарлах боломжтой байдал гэж боддог. Сургуулийн үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд бусад тусламжтай ажил бүрэн судалгаагүй. Энэ судалгаанд, мэдлэгтэй хуваалцах хэлбэрээр, олон ажлын суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үндсэн, бид төстэй метрик загварыг зориулагдсан хэлний NER үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд тусламжтай ажил болгодог. Тодорхой хэлбэл, биетийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөгч болон тэнцүү байдлын оюутнууд эхлээд хоёр багш нарын хувьд параллел боловсруулагддаг. Тэгээд оюутнуудын загварын хоёр даалгавар багш нар одоогоор удирдаж байна. 7 өөр хэл дээрх гурван өгөгдлийн сангийн шинжлэх ухааны судалгаа санал өгсөн загварын үр дүнг баталдаг.', 'no': 'Krysspråk oppgåve med namnet entitetskjenning er ein av dei kritiske problemene for å evaluera potensielle læringsteknikane for overføring på låg ressursspråk. Kjentsdistillering med fleirspråk- modeller mellom kjeldespråk og målspråk har vist overhøgda i overføring. Det finst imidlertid eksisterande krysspråk-destilasjonsmodeller berre gjennom potensielle overføringsbehandlingar mellom to identiske enkelte oppgåver i begge domene. Andre moglege hjelpeoppgåver for å forbetra læringsfunksjonen er ikkje fullstendig undersøkt. I denne studien, basert på kunnskapsdistillasjonsrammeverket og fleire oppgåver, introduserer vi tilsvarende metriske modellen som eit hjelpeoppgåve for å forbetra den krysspråksfunksjonen av NER på målsdomenet. Spesifisert er ein entitetskjenner og ein liknandevaluering først trent parallelt som to lærarar frå kjeldedomenet. Så er to oppgåver i studentmodellen oversikt av desse lærarane samtidig. Empirical studies on the three datasets across 7 different languages confirm the effectiveness of the proposed model.', 'mt': 'Il-kompitu tar-rikonoxximent tal-entità msemmi b’mod translingwi huwa wieħed mill-problemi kritiċi għall-evalwazzjoni tat-tekniki potenzjali ta’ tagħlim ta’ trasferiment fuq lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi. Id-distillazzjoni tal-għarfien bl-użu ta’ mudelli multilingwi mħarrġa minn qabel bejn il-lingwi tas-sors u l-lingwi fil-mira wriet is-superjorità tagħhom fit-trasferiment. Madankollu, mudelli ta’ distillazzjoni translingwi eżistenti jqisu biss it-trasferibbiltà potenzjali bejn żewġ kompiti individwali identiċi fiż-żewġ oqsma. Kompiti awżiljarji oħra possibbli għat-titjib tal-prestazzjoni tat-tagħlim ma ġewx investigati bis-sħiħ. F’dan l-istudju, ibbażat fuq il-qafas tad-distillazzjoni tal-għarfien u t-tagħlim b’diversi kompiti, aħna nintroduċu l-mudell metriku ta’ similarità bħala kompitu awżiljarju biex tittejjeb il-prestazzjoni translingwistika tan-NER fid-dominju fil-mira. Speċifikament, rikonoxxitur ta’ entità u evalwatur ta’ similarità huma l-ewwel imħarrġa b’mod parallel bħala żewġ għalliema mid-dominju tas-sors. Imbagħad, żewġ kompiti fil-mudell tal-istudenti huma ssorveljati minn dawn l-għalliema fl-istess ħin. Studji empiriċi dwar it-tliet settijiet ta’ dejta f’7 lingwi differenti jikkonfermaw l-effettività tal-mudell propost.', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne zadanie rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek jest jednym z kluczowych problemów oceny potencjalnych technik uczenia się transferu na językach niskich zasobów. Destylacja wiedzy z wykorzystaniem wstępnie przeszkolonych wielojęzycznych modeli językowych między językami źródłowymi i docelowymi wykazała swoją wyższość w transferze. Jednakże istniejące modele destylacji wielojęzycznej uwzględniają jedynie potencjalną możliwość przenoszenia dwóch identycznych pojedynczych zadań w obu dziedzinach. Inne możliwe zadania pomocnicze mające na celu poprawę wydajności uczenia się nie zostały w pełni zbadane. W niniejszym opracowaniu, w oparciu o ramy destylacji wiedzy i wielozadaniowego uczenia się, wprowadzamy model metryczny podobieństwa jako zadanie pomocnicze w celu poprawy wydajności między językami NER w domenie docelowej. W szczególności rozpoznający podmiot i oceniający podobieństwo są najpierw szkoleni równolegle jako dwóch nauczycieli z domeny źródłowej. Następnie dwa zadania w modelu studenckim są nadzorowane przez tych nauczycieli jednocześnie. Badania empiryczne dotyczące trzech zbiorów danych w siedmiu różnych językach potwierdzają skuteczność proponowanego modelu.', 'ro': 'Activitatea de recunoaștere a entităților denumite în mai multe limbi reprezintă una dintre problemele esențiale pentru evaluarea tehnicilor de învățare potențiale de transfer pe limbile cu resurse reduse. Distilarea cunoștințelor folosind modele lingvistice multilingve pre-instruite între limbile sursă și limbile țintă și-au demonstrat superioritatea lor în transfer. Cu toate acestea, modelele existente de distilare translingvă nu iau în considerare decât posibilitatea transferării între două sarcini unice identice în ambele domenii. Alte posibile sarcini auxiliare pentru îmbunătățirea performanței de învățare nu au fost investigate pe deplin. În acest studiu, pe baza cadrului de distilare a cunoștințelor și a învățării multi-task, introducem modelul metric de similitudine ca sarcină auxiliară pentru îmbunătățirea performanței NER translingvistice pe domeniul țintă. Mai exact, un recunoscător de entități și un evaluator de similitudine sunt instruiți mai întâi în paralel ca doi profesori din domeniul sursă. Apoi, două sarcini în modelul elevilor sunt supravegheate simultan de acești profesori. Studiile empirice privind cele trei seturi de date din 7 limbi diferite confirmă eficacitatea modelului propus.', 'so': 'Shaqada aqoonsiga ee iskuulka lagu magacaabay waa dhibaatooyin muhiim ah oo ku qiimeynaya teknikada waxbarashada ee suurtagalka ah oo ku qoran luqadaha hoose ee macluumaadka. Knowledge distillation using pre-trained multilingual language models between source and target languages have shown their superiority in transfer.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee samooyin kala duwan oo luuqadaha ku jira oo kaliya waxay ka fikiraan in laga beddelo labada shaqo oo isku mid ah labada dowladood oo dhan. Shaqooyin kale oo suurtagal ah in la hagaajiyo tababarka waxbarashada lama baahan doono si buuxa ah. Waxbarashadan, sababo ku saleysan tababarka aqoonta iyo waxbarashada shaqada kala duduwan, waxaynu u soo bandhignaynaa tusaale u eg metric oo ah shaqo la xiriira si loo hagaajiyo sameynta afka NER ee ku qoran goobaha goalka. Si gaar ah waxaa marka ugu horeysa lagu baraa aqoonsiga jidhka iyo qiimeeyaha isku mid ah sida labada macallin oo kale ee gudaha asalka ah. Markaas waxaa isla markaasna macallimiinta la ilaaliyaa laba shaqo oo ku jira modelka ardayda. Waxbarashada shahaadada ee saddexda databaseed oo ku qoran 7 luuqadood oo kala duduwan waxay xaqiijiyaan effektada modelka la soo jeeday.', 'sr': 'Prejezički zadatak priznanja entiteta je jedan od kritičnih problema za procjenu potencijalnih tehnika učenja prijenosa na jezicima niskih resursa. Destilacija znanja koristeći predobučene multijezičke modele između izvora i ciljnih jezika pokazala je svoju superiornost u prijenosu. Međutim, postojeći međujezički modeli destilacije smatraju potencijalnom prenošljivošću između dva identična jedinstvena zadataka u oba domena. Drugi mogući pomoćni zadatak za poboljšanje učenja nije potpuno istražen. U ovoj studiji, na osnovu okvira destilacije znanja i učenja više zadataka, predstavljamo metrički model sličnosti kao pomoćni zadatak kako bi poboljšali cross-lingual NER performance na ciljnom domenu. Posebno, priznavač entiteta i procenator sličnosti su prvi put obučeni paralelno kao dva učitelja iz izvornog domena. Onda su dve zadatke u studentskom modelu istovremeno nadzirale ovi nastavnici. Empiričke studije o tri podataka na 7 različitih jezika potvrđuju učinkovitost predloženog modela.', 'sv': 'Tv채rspr책kig namngiven entitetsigenk채nningsuppgift 채r ett av de kritiska problemen f철r att utv채rdera potentiell 철verf철ringsinl채rningsteknik p책 spr책k med l책ga resurser. Kunskapsdestillation med f철rutbildade flerspr책kiga spr책kmodeller mellan k채ll- och m책lspr책k har visat sin 철verl채gsenhet i 철verf철ringen. I befintliga tv채rspr책kiga destillationsmodeller beaktas dock endast m철jligheten att 철verf철ra tv책 identiska enskilda uppgifter inom b책da omr책dena. Andra m철jliga hj채lpuppgifter f철r att f철rb채ttra l채randeprestationen har inte unders철kts fullt ut. I denna studie, baserad p책 kunskapsdestillationsramverket och multi-task learning, introducerar vi den metriska modellen f철r likhet som en hj채lpuppgift f철r att f철rb채ttra den tv채rspr책kiga NER-prestandan p책 m책ldom채nen. Specifikt utbildas en entitetsigenk채nnare och en likabehandlingsutv채rderare f철rst parallellt som tv책 l채rare fr책n k채lldom채nen. D채refter 철vervakas tv책 uppgifter i elevmodellen av dessa l채rare samtidigt. Empiriska studier av de tre dataupps채ttningarna p책 sju olika spr책k bekr채ftar den f철reslagna modellens effektivitet.', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාවක් නම් අයිතිය අඳුරන් වැඩක් අවශ්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ්\u200dය මුළු භාෂාවය සහ ඉලක්ක භාෂාවය අතර ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂණය පෙ නමුත්, වැඩි භාෂාවක් විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර දෙන්නම් ප්\u200dරතිකාර දෙන්න පුළුවන් වි අනිත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පුළුවන් උදව් වැඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සංපූර්ණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, දැනගන්න විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, අපි මෙට්\u200dරික් මොඩල් එකක් විශ්ලේෂණය වෙනුවෙන් ඉලක්ෂණයේදී ව විශේෂයෙන්, ප්\u200dරධානයක් අඳුරගන්න සහ සමාන විශේෂකයෙක් පළමු ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය දෙන්නෙක් විදියට ඊට පස්සේ, විද්\u200dයාර්ථික මොඩල් එකේ වැඩක් දෙකක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා මේ ගුරුවරුන් එක්කෙනෙක්ම. වෙනස් භාෂාවල් 7ක් විතරයි දත්ත සූදානය තුනක් ගැන අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක', 'ta': 'கிருஸ்- மொழி பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளச் செயல் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகளில் சாத்தியமான மாற்றும் கற்றல் தொழில்நுட்பத் மூலம் மற்றும் இலக்கு மொழிகளுக்கிடையே முன் பயிற்சி பல மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி அறிவு பிரிவு பெரிய மாற்றம்  ஆனால் இருக்கும் மொழி பிரிப்பு மாதிரிகள் இருக்கும் இரண்டு ஒற்றைப் போன்ற இரண்டு பணிகளுக்கும் இடையே சாத்தியமான மாற்றம கல்வி செயலை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டிய மற்ற சாத்தியமான அணுகல் பணிகள் முழுமையாக ஆராய்ச்சிக்கப்படவில்லை. இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், அறிவு பிரிப்பு சட்டம் மற்றும் பல பணி கற்றல் அடிப்படையில், நாம் இலக்கு களத்தில் உள்ள மெட்ரிக் மாதிரி முறைமையை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு ஒரு க குறிப்பிட்டு, ஒரு பொருள் அடையாளம் மற்றும் ஒரு சமமான மதிப்பாளர் மூலத்தின் இரு ஆசிரியர்களாக முதலில் பயிற்சிக்கப்படுகிறது. பின்னர், மாணவர் மாதிரியில் இரண்டு பணிகள் ஒரே நேரத்தில் இந்த ஆசிரியர்கள் கண்காணிக்கப்படுகின்றன. ஏழு மொழிகளில் மூன்று தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் வித்தியாசமான மாதிரியின் விளைவை உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது.', 'ur': 'کروس زبان کے نام پر ایک ٹیٹی کی شناسایی کا کام کم سراسر زبانوں کے ذریعے سزاوار ترنسیٹ ٹیٹنیک کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے ایک ضروری مسئلہ ہے۔ علم distillation using pre-trained multilingual language models between source and target languages has shown their superiority in transfer. لیکن، موجود مختلف زبان کے متفرق نمونے صرف دو ڈومین کے درمیان موجود انتقال قابلیت کو دیکھتے ہیں. تعلیم کے عملکرد کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے دوسرے امکان مددگار کام پورے طور پر تحقیق نہیں کی گئی۔ اس مطالعہ میں، علم متفرق فرم اور بہت سی ٹاکس کی تعلیم پر بنیاد ہے، ہم مطالعہ متریک موڈل کو ایک مددگار ٹاکس کے طور پر نشان دیتے ہیں کہ مقررہ دامین پر cross-lingual NER performance improving کریں. مخصوص طور پر، ایک انٹیٹی پہچان کرنے والا اور ایک برابری ارزیابی کرنے والا پہلی بار سورس ڈمین سے دو استاد کے طور پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے. پھر ان استاد مدلک میں دو کام ایک دفعہ ان استاد کے ذریعے نظارت کی جاتی ہیں۔ سات مختلف زبانوں میں تین ڈاٹ سٹ کے معاملہ میں مصنوعی تحقیقات کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ پیشنهاد مدل کی عملکرد ہے.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Lekin, har bir xil tilni ajratish modellari faqat ikkita huddi ikkita bir xil vazifalar orasidagi o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. Ахборлик бажаришини афзал қилиш учун бошқа имкониятлар ўзгартириш вазифалари муваффақиятсиз тафаккур қилмади. Bu o'qituvda, ilmo'zgarishni o'rganishni va ko'plab vazifani o'rganish asosida, biz ma'lum metrik modelini qo'shish uchun qo'llanmalar qo'shilgan NER amalni oshirish uchun foydalanamiz. Ko'rsatilgan, ma'lumotni tanlash va bir xil qiymatchi birinchi qiymatlar manba domenadagi ikki muallifi sifatida o'rganadi. Keyin, o'qituvchi modeldagi ikkita vazifalar bu o'qituvchilar bir xil paytida boshqaruvchidir. Uchta tillar ichida uchta maʼlumotlar tarkibi o'qituvchilari davomiy qilingan modelning effektini ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ nhận dạng thực thể được đặt tên xuyên lục địa là một trong những vấn đề quan trọng trong việc đánh giá kỹ thuật học chuyển nhượng về ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Việc chưng cất tri thức dựa trên các mô hình ngôn ngữ đa dạng đã được đào tạo giữa ngôn ngữ nguồn và ngôn ngữ đích đã cho thấy ưu thế trong việc chuyển tiếp. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình chưng cất xuyên ngôn ngữ hiện tại chỉ đơn thuần cân nhắc khả năng chuyển giao giữa hai công việc đơn lẻ giống nhau trong hai lĩnh vực. Những nhiệm vụ trợ giúp có thể cải thiện khả năng học tập vẫn chưa được nghiên cứu đầy đủ. Trong nghiên cứu này, dựa trên chế độ chưng cất kiến thức và việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ, chúng tôi đưa ra mô hình mô phỏng giống nhau như một nhiệm vụ phụ trợ để cải thiện hiệu suất tối đa ngôn ngữ trên lĩnh vực đích. Cụ thể, một người nhận diện và một người phân tích điểm chung được đào tạo song song như hai giáo viên từ lĩnh vực nguồn. Sau đó, hai công việc trong mô hình sinh viên được giám sát đồng thời bởi các giáo viên. Các nghiên cứu tích cực về ba bộ dữ liệu trên bảy ngôn ngữ khác nhau xác nhận hiệu quả của mô hình đề xuất.', 'da': 'Tværsproget navngivet enhedsgenkendelse opgave er et af de kritiske problemer for evaluering af potentielle overførsel af læringsteknikker på lav ressource sprog. Vidensdestillation ved hjælp af forududdannede flersprogede sprogmodeller mellem kilde- og målsprog har vist deres overlegenhed i overførsel. De eksisterende tværsprogede destillationsmodeller tager imidlertid kun hensyn til muligheden for overførsel mellem to identiske enkelte opgaver på tværs af begge områder. Andre mulige hjælpeopgaver til forbedring af læringsydelsen er ikke blevet undersøgt fuldt ud. I denne undersøgelse, baseret på videndelestillationsrammen og multi-task learning, introducerer vi lighedsmetrisk model som en hjælpeopgave til at forbedre den tværsprogede NER performance på måldomænet. Specielt uddannes en enhedsgenkender og en lighedsevaluator først parallelt som to lærere fra kildedænet. Derefter overvåges to opgaver i elevmodellen af disse lærere samtidig. Empiriske undersøgelser af de tre datasæt på syv forskellige sprog bekræfter effektiviteten af den foreslåede model.', 'bg': 'Задачата за разпознаване на междуезични обекти е един от критичните проблеми за оценка на потенциалните техники за трансферно обучение на езици с ниски ресурси. Дестилацията на знанията чрез предварително обучени многоезични езикови модели между изходните и целевите езици показа своето превъзходство в трансфера. Съществуващите междуезични модели на дестилация обаче само разглеждат потенциалната преносимост между две еднакви единични задачи в двете области. Други възможни спомагателни задачи за подобряване на учебната ефективност не са напълно проучени. В това проучване, базирано на рамката за дестилация на знания и многозадачи обучение, ние въвеждаме модела на прилика като допълнителна задача за подобряване на междуезичното представяне на НЕР в целевата област. По-конкретно, разпознаващият субект и оценителят на сходството първо се обучават паралелно като двама учители от домейна източник. След това две задачи в студентския модел се ръководят едновременно от тези учители. Емпирични проучвания на трите набора от данни на 7 различни езика потвърждават ефективността на предлагания модел.', 'hr': 'Jedan od kritičnih problema za procjenu potencijalnih tehnika učenja prijenosa na jezicima niskih resursa. Destilacija znanja koristeći predobučene multijezičke modele između izvora i ciljnih jezika pokazala je svoju nadmoćnost prijenosa. Međutim, postojeći međujezički modeli destilacije smatraju potencijalnom prijenosnošću između dva identična jedinstvena zadatka u obje domene. Drugi mogući pomoćni zadatak za poboljšanje učenja nije potpuno istražen. U ovom ispitivanju, temeljito na okviru destilacije znanja i učenju više zadataka, predstavljamo metrički model sličnosti kao pomoćni zadatak za poboljšanje cross-lingual NER performance na ciljnom domenu. Posebno, priznatelj entiteta i procjenitelj sličnosti su prvi trenirani paralelno kao dva učitelja iz izvornog domena. Onda su dvije zadatke u studentskom modelu istovremeno nadzirale ovi učitelji. Empirička ispitivanja o tri podataka na 7 različitih jezika potvrđuju učinkovitost predloženog modela.', 'nl': 'Cross-lingual named entity herkenning taak is een van de cruciale problemen voor het evalueren van de potentiële overdracht leertechnieken op low resource talen. Kennisdestillatie met behulp van vooraf getrainde meertalige taalmodellen tussen bron- en doeltalen heeft hun superioriteit in overdracht aangetoond. Bestaande meertalige distillatiemodellen houden echter alleen rekening met de mogelijke overdraagbaarheid tussen twee identieke taken in beide domeinen. Andere mogelijke hulptaken om de leerprestaties te verbeteren zijn niet volledig onderzocht. In deze studie, gebaseerd op het kennisdestillatiekraamwerk en multi-task leren, introduceren we het vergelijkingsmetrische model als een hulptaak om de cross-lingual NER prestaties op het doeldomein te verbeteren. In het bijzonder worden een entiteitsherkenner en een gelijkenisbeoordelaar eerst parallel getraind als twee docenten uit het brondomein. Vervolgens worden twee taken in het studentenmodel gelijktijdig begeleid door deze docenten. Empirische studies naar de drie datasets in zeven verschillende talen bevestigen de effectiviteit van het voorgestelde model.', 'de': 'Die sprachübergreifende Erkennungsaufgabe benannter Entitäten ist eines der kritischen Probleme bei der Bewertung der potenziellen Transfer-Lerntechniken auf ressourcenarmen Sprachen. Die Wissensdestillation mittels vortrainierter mehrsprachiger Sprachmodelle zwischen Ausgangs- und Zielsprachen hat ihre Überlegenheit im Transfer gezeigt. Allerdings berücksichtigen bestehende crosslinguale Destillationsmodelle lediglich die mögliche Übertragbarkeit zwischen zwei identischen Einzelaufgaben in beiden Domänen. Andere mögliche Hilfsaufgaben zur Verbesserung der Lernleistung wurden nicht vollständig untersucht. In dieser Studie, basierend auf dem Wissensdestillationsframework und dem Multi-Task-Lernen, stellen wir das Ähnlichkeits-metrische Modell als Hilfsaufgabe vor, um die crosslinguale NER-Leistung auf der Zieldomäne zu verbessern. Konkret werden ein Entity Recognizer und ein Ähnlichkeitsbewerter zunächst parallel zu zwei Lehrern aus dem Quellbereich ausgebildet. Anschließend werden zwei Aufgaben im Schülermodell von diesen Lehrern gleichzeitig betreut. Empirische Studien zu den drei Datensätzen in sieben verschiedenen Sprachen bestätigen die Wirksamkeit des vorgeschlagenen Modells.', 'ko': '다중 언어 명명 실체 식별 임무는 저자원 언어의 잠재적 이동 학습 기술을 평가하는 관건적인 문제 중 하나이다.원시 언어와 목표 언어 사이에 미리 훈련된 다중 언어 모델을 사용하여 지식 추출을 하는 것은 이동에 있어 장점을 나타낸다.그러나 기존의 다중 언어 증류 모델은 두 가지 같은 임무가 두 분야 간의 잠재적 이동성을 고려했을 뿐이다.학습 성적을 높이기 위한 다른 가능한 보조 임무는 아직 충분히 조사되지 않았다.본 연구에서 지식 추출 프레임워크와 다중 임무 학습을 바탕으로 우리는 유사성 도량모델을 보조 임무로 도입하여 목표 분야의 다중 언어 NER 성능을 향상시켰다.구체적으로 실체 식별기와 유사성 평가기를 원역에서 온 두 명의 교사로 병행 교육을 실시한다.그리고 학생 모델 중의 두 가지 임무는 이 교사들이 동시에 감독한다.7가지 서로 다른 언어의 세 가지 데이터 집합에 대한 실증 연구는 이 모델의 유효성을 증명했다.', 'id': 'Tugas pengenalan entitas bernama saling bahasa adalah salah satu masalah kritis untuk mengevaluasi teknik penerimaan potensial pada bahasa sumber daya rendah. Knowledge distillation using pre-trained multilingual language models between source and target languages have shown their superiority in transfer.  Namun, model distillasi saling bahasa yang ada hanya mempertimbangkan potensi transferabilitas antara dua tugas tunggal identik di kedua domain. Tugas bantuan lain yang mungkin untuk meningkatkan prestasi belajar belum diselidiki sepenuhnya. Dalam studi ini, berdasarkan cadangan destilasi pengetahuan dan pembelajaran multi-tugas, kami memperkenalkan model metrik persamaan sebagai tugas bantuan untuk meningkatkan prestasi NER salib bahasa pada domain target. Secara khusus, pengenal entitas dan evaluasi persamaan pertama dilatih secara parallel sebagai dua guru dari domain sumber. Kemudian, dua tugas dalam model siswa diawasi oleh guru-guru ini secara bersamaan. Studi kerajaan pada tiga dataset di seluruh 7 bahasa yang berbeda mengkonfirmasi efektivitas model yang diusulkan.', 'fa': 'وظیفه شناسایی واحد متوسط زبان یک از مشکلات ضروری برای ارزیابی تکنیک انتقال پتانسیل یادگیری در زبانهای منابع کم است. تفاوت دانش با استفاده از مدل های زیادی زبان پیش آموزش داده شده بین زبانهای منبع و هدف، بزرگتری خود را در انتقال نشان داده است. ولی مدلهای جدایی از زبانهای متفاوتی وجود دارد، فقط به نظر می رسد که قابلیت انتقال پتانسیل بین دو کار یکسان در هر دو دامنه است. کارهای دیگری که ممکن است کمک کنند تا عملکرد یادگیری را بهتر کند کاملا تحقیق نشده است. در این مطالعه، بر اساس چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار مخصوصاً یک شناخته کننده و یک ارزیابی شباهت اول به عنوان دو معلم از دومین منبع آموزش داده می شوند. بعدش، دو کار در مدل دانش آموزان همزمان توسط این معلم ها کنترل می شوند. تحقیقات امپراطوری درباره سه مجموعه داده در ۷ زبان مختلف تایید می\u200cکند که موثرت مدل پیشنهاد را ثابت می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Adamlar birnäçe dilli bar bir zat tanamak zady iň az resurs dilinde gelen öwrenmek tekniklerini çykarmak üçin wajyp meselelerdir. Bilim öňünden bilim tapawutlanmasy köp dil nusgalaryndan çeşme we maksadat dilleriniň arasynda özleriniň üstünliklerini terjime etmäge görkezildi. Ýöne bolan cross-lingual taýýarlama nusgalary diňe iki ýeke işiň arasynda hem sahypa iki täk işiň arasynda mümkin taýýarlanabiligini düşünýär. Öwrenme etkinleşigini geliştirmek üçin başga kömek görevler doly barlanmady. Bu araştırmada, bilim taýýarlama çerçevesine ve çoklu-täblik öwrenmesine dayanan, meýdanlık metrik modelini hedef domaýynda cross-lingual NER eserini geliştirmek üçin yardımcı bir görev olarak tanıştırıyoruz. Adatça, birnäçe tanyşçy we meňzeşlik deňleşçisi ilkinji gezek çeşme domaýyndaky iki mugallymçy hökmünde parallel bellenilýär. Soňra okuwçylar nusgasynda iki işi bu mugallymlar bilen gözleýärler. 7 dürli dillerde üç sany sanat setirinde empirik öwrenmeler teklip eden nusganyň etkinleşigini tassyklaýar.', 'af': "Krysspraak genaamde entiteit herkening taak is een van die kritiese probleme vir die evaluering van die potensieele oordragteknike van leer teknike op lae hulpbron tale. Keningsdistillasie gebruik voor- onderwerpende multitaal modele tussen bron en doel tale het hulle hoogtigheid in oordrag vertoon. Alhoewel, bestaande kruistale destilasie-modelles oorskou net die potensiele oordragbare tussen twee identiese enkele taak oor beide domeine. Ander moontlike hulpbron-opdragte om die leerprogramme te verbeter is nie volledig ondersoek nie. In hierdie studie, gebaseer op die kennis-destilasie raamwerk en multi-taak-leer, introduseer ons die gelykenis metriese model as 'n helper taak om die kruistale NER-prestasie op die doel domein te verbeter. Spesifieke, 'n entiteit herken en 'n gelykheidsevalueerder word eerste in parallel as twee onderwysers van die bron domein opgelei. Dan is twee taak in die student model ondersoek deur hierdie onderwysers simultaan. Empirical studies on the three datasets across 7 different languages confirm the effectiveness of the proposed model.", 'sq': 'Cross-lingual named entity recognition task is one of the critical problems for evaluating the potential transfer learning techniques on low resource languages.  Distillimi i njohurive duke përdorur modele të paratrajnuara gjuhësh shumëgjuhësore midis gjuhëve burimore dhe objektive kanë treguar superioritetin e tyre në transferim. Megjithatë, modelet ekzistuese të distillacionit ndërgjuhësor thjesht konsiderojnë transferueshmërinë e mundshme midis dy detyrave identike të vetme nëpër të dy fushat. Detyrat e tjera të mundshme ndihmëse për përmirësimin e performancës së mësimit nuk janë hetuar plotësisht. Në këtë studim, bazuar në kuadrin e distillacionit të njohurive dhe mësimin me shumë detyra, ne paraqesim modelin metrik të ngjashmërisë si një detyrë ndihmëse për të përmirësuar paraqitjen ndërgjuhësore të NER në domenin e objektivit. Veçan ërisht, një njohës njësie dhe një vlerësues i ngjashmërisë janë trajnuar së pari në paralel si dy mësues nga domenia e burimit. Pastaj, dy detyra në model in e student ëve mbikqyren njëkohësisht nga këta mësues. Studimet perandore mbi tre grupet e të dhënave nëpërmjet 7 gjuhëve të ndryshme konfirmojnë efektshmërinë e modelit të propozuar.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya kutambuliwa kwa lugha inayoitwa na utambulisho wa entity ni moja ya matatizo muhimu ya kutathmini teknolojia za kujifunza kwa lugha ndogo ya rasilimali. Kutofautiana na maarifa kwa kutumia mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla ya lugha mbalimbali kati ya chanzo na lugha zinazolenga imeonyesha ubora wao katika uhamishaji. Hata hivyo, mifano ya utofauti wa lugha tofauti yanayopo katika lugha mbalimbali tu hufikiria uwezekano wa mabadiliko kati ya kazi mbili tofauti moja katika maeneo yote. Vitendo vingine vya ushirikiano ili kuboresha utendaji wa mafunzo haujachunguzwa vizuri. Katika utafiti huu, kwa kuzingatia mfumo wa ufahamu wa kutofautisha maarifa na kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi, tunaonyesha mtindo wa aina hiyo kama jukumu la ushirikiano wa kuboresha utendaji wa NER katika eneo la lengo. Kwa ujumla, mtambuzi wa entity na mtafiti wa mfano wa namna hiyo kwanza wamefundishwa kwa kulinganisha kama walimu wawili kutoka ndani ya chanzo hicho. Kisha, kazi mbili katika muundo wa wanafunzi hufuatiliwa na walimu hawa wakati huo. Utafiti wa utafiti wa taarifa tatu katika lugha 7 tofauti zinathibitisha ufanisi wa muundo huo wa pendekezo.', 'am': 'የመስመር ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ አካባቢ ማወቅ ስራ በሚያሰቃየው የቻይነት ትምህርት ትምህርት ማቀናቀል ቋንቋዎች በሚያሰናከል አንዱ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋዎች እና አቃራቢ ቋንቋዎች መካከል በተለየ በፊት የተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም እውቀት ለራሳቸው የበለጠ መጠቀሚያ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መለያየት ዓይነቶች በሁለቱ ሀገሮች መካከል የሚመስል አንድ ስራ የሚለውጥ ስልጣን ብቻ ይመለከታሉ፡፡ ትምህርትን ለማሻሻል የሚችሉትን ሌሎችን ተግባር ስራዎች በሙሉ አልተመረመርም፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት፣ እውቀት መለያየት ፍሬም እና በብዙ ስራ ትምህርት በመሠረት፣ በተለያዩ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ላይ የNER ድረ መሥራትን በማሻሻል እናስጠጋለን፡፡ Specifically, an entity recognizer and a similarity evaluator are first trained in parallel as two teachers from the source domain.  ከዚህም በኋላ ሁለት ተማሪ ሞዴል ውስጥ ያሉ ተማሪዎችን በአንድ ጊዜ ይጠብቃሉ፡፡ በ7 ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ያሉትን ሦስት ዳታተርሚቶች የሞዴል ጥያቄውን ያረጋግጣሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Միայն լեզվով կոչվող առանձնահատկությունների ճանաչության խնդիրներից մեկն է, որը կարևոր է ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուների ուսումնասիրության պոտենցիալ փոխանցման մեթոդների գնահատման համար: Գիտության դիսլիլացիան, օգտագործելով նախապատրաստված բազմալեզու լեզվի մոդելներ աղբյուրի և նպատակային լեզուների միջև, ցույց է տալիս, որ դրանք գերազանցություն են ստացվում փոխանցման մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող երկլեզվային դիսլիլացիայի մոդելները պարզապես հաշվի առնում են պոտենցիալ փոխանցելիությունը երկու միևնույն առաջադրանքների միջև: Մյուս հնարավոր օգնական խնդիրները ուսուցման արդյունքի բարելավման համար ամբողջովին չեն ուսումնասիրել: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում, հիմնված գիտելիքների դիսլիլացիայի շրջանակների և բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության վրա, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նմանության մետրական մոդելը որպես օգնական խնդիր, որպեսզի բարելավենք նպատակային բնագավառի միջլեզվային ՆԵՌ Մասնավորապես, անհատականության ճանաչողը և նմանության գնահատողը առաջին անգամ զուգահեռ են դասավանդվում որպես աղբյուր բնագավառից երկու ուսուցիչ: Հետո ուսանողների մոդելի երկու խնդիր միաժամանակ վերահսկվում են այս ուսուցիչների կողմից: Երեք տվյալների կայսրական ուսումնասիրությունները 7 տարբեր լեզուներում հաստատում են առաջարկված մոդելի արդյունավետությունը:', 'az': 'İntikat tanıması təqdirdə dillərin çoxlu təqdirdə istifadə etmə məqsədilindən biridir. Məlumat və məqsəd dillərin arasındakı çoxlu dil modelləri ilə öyrənib təhsil edilən bilgi destilyası onların üstünlüyünü transferdə göstərdi. Halbuki, çox dilli destilasyon modelləri yalnız iki domenin arasında eyni bir iş arasındakı mümkün olaraq hərəkət edə bilər. Öyrənmə performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün başqa mümkün yardım işləri tamamlanmadı. Bu təcrübədə, elm destilasyonu frameworku və çoxlu işlər öyrənməsinə dayanan, bənzər metrik modelini məqsəd domeində çoxlu dil NER performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün köməkçi bir iş olaraq tanıyırıq. Özellikle, bir entitə tanıyıcı və bənzər değerlendirici ilk dəfə mənbə domeinindən iki müəllimin kimi paralel olaraq təhsil edilir. Sonra, öğrenci modelində iki işi bu müəllimlərin birlikdə gözləyir. 7 müxtəlif dillər arasında üç verilən quruların iməlikli təhsil edilmiş modelinin etkinliğini təsdiqləyir.', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার নামে প্রতিষ্ঠান স্বীকৃতির কাজ হচ্ছে কম সম্ভাব্য সম্ভাবনা পরিবর্তনের ক্ষেত্রে শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তি মূল্যায়নের জন্ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বহুভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করে জ্ঞান বিভাগের বিভাগ উৎস এবং লক্ষ্য ভাষার মধ্যে তাদের অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ তবে বিদ্যমান ক্রিভাষাভাষী বৈচিত্র্য মডেল শুধুমাত্র দুই ডোমেনের মধ্যে সম্ভাবনা পরিবর্তনের সম্ভাবনা বিবেচনা করে। শিক্ষার প্রভাব উন্নত করার জন্য অন্যান্য সম্ভাব্য অনুযায়ী কাজ সম্পূর্ণ তদন্ত করা হয়নি। এই গবেষণায়, জ্ঞান বিচ্ছিন্ন কার্যক্রম এবং বহুকাজ শিক্ষার উপর ভিত্তিতে আমরা একই ধরনের মেট্রিক মডেল হিসেবে চিহ্নিত করি যাতে ক্রিশ ভাষাভাষী নেআরব প্রদর্শনে বিশেষ করে, একটি প্রতিষ্ঠান স্বীকৃতি এবং এক সমতার মূল্যায়নের প্রথমে উৎস ডোমেইন থেকে দুই শিক্ষক হিসেবে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা  তারপর, ছাত্র মডেলের দুই কাজ একই সাথে শিক্ষকদের দ্বারা পর্যবেক্ষণ করে। প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের কার্যক্রম নিশ্চিত করে সারা ৭ ভাষায় তিনটি তথ্য সংক্রান্ত গবেষণা সম্পর্কে।', 'bs': 'Prejezički zadatak priznanja entiteta je jedan od kritičnih problema za procjenu potencijalnih tehnika učenja transfera na jezicima niskih resursa. Destilacija znanja koristeći predobučene multijezičke modele između izvora i ciljnih jezika pokazala je svoju nadmoćnost prijenosa. Međutim, postojeći međujezički modeli destilacije smatraju potencijalnom prenošljivošću između dva identična jedinstvena zadatka u oba domena. Drugi mogući pomoćni zadatak za poboljšanje učenja nije potpuno istražen. U ovom ispitivanju, temeljito na okviru destilacije znanja i učenju multi task, predstavljamo metrički model sličnosti kao pomoćni zadatak za poboljšanje cross-lingual NER performance na ciljnom domenu. Posebno, priznavač entiteta i procjenar sličnosti prvi su obučeni paralelno kao dva učitelja iz izvornog domena. Onda su dvije zadatke u studentskom modelu istovremeno nadzirale ovi nastavnici. Empirička ispitivanja o tri podataka na 7 različitih jezika potvrđuju učinkovitost predloženog modela.', 'cs': 'Úloha rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit je jedním z klíčových problémů pro hodnocení potenciálních přenosových učebních technik na jazycích s nízkými zdroji. Destilace znalostí pomocí předškolených vícejazyčných jazykových modelů mezi zdrojovými a cílovými jazyky ukázala svou nadřazenost v přenosu. Stávající modely destilace však pouze zohledňují potenciální přenositelnost mezi dvěma identickými jednotlivými úkoly napříč oběma doménami. Další možné pomocné úkoly ke zlepšení výkonnosti učení nebyly plně zkoumány. V této studii, na základě rámce destilace znalostí a víceúkolového učení, představujeme metrický model podobnosti jako pomocný úkol ke zlepšení výkonu mezi jazyky NER na cílové doméně. Konkrétně, rozpoznávač entit a hodnotitel podobnosti jsou nejprve současně školeni jako dva učitelé ze zdrojové domény. Následně dvě úkoly v studentském modelu vedou tito učitelé současně. Empirické studie těchto tří datových souborů v sedmi různých jazycích potvrzují účinnost navrhovaného modelu.', 'ca': "La tasca de reconeixement interlingüístic d'entitats és un dels problemes crítics per avaluar les tècniques d'aprenentatge potencials de transfer ència en llengües de baix recursos. La distillació del coneixement utilitzant models de llenguatges multillengües pré-entrenats entre les llengües fonts i alvos ha demostrat la seva superioritat en la transfer ència. No obstant això, els models de distillació translingüística existents només consideran la transferibilitat potencial entre dues tasques senzilles idèntiques en ambdós dominis. Other possible auxiliary tasks to improve the learning performance have not been fully investigated.  En aquest estudi, basat en el marc de distillació del coneixement i l'aprenentatge multitascat, introduim el model mètric de similitud com una tasca auxiliar per millorar el rendiment translingüístic del NER en el domini d'objectiu. Concretament, un reconeixedor d'entitats i un evaluador de similituds es forman per primera vegada en paral·lel com dos professors del domini de fonts. Després, dues tasques del model estudiant són supervisades simultàniament pels professors. Els estudis empírics sobre els tres conjunts de dades en 7 llengües diferents confirmen l'eficacia del model proposat.", 'et': 'Keeleülene nimetatud olemi tuvastamise ülesanne on üks kriitilisi probleeme võimalike siirdeõppe meetodite hindamisel vähese ressursiga keeltes. Teadmiste destilleerimine eelnevalt koolitatud mitmekeelsete keelemudelite abil lähte- ja sihtkeelte vahel on näidanud oma ülekande paremust. Olemasolevates keeltevahelistes destilleerimismudelites võetakse siiski arvesse võimalikku ülekantavust kahe identse üksiku ülesande vahel mõlemas valdkonnas. Muud võimalikud abiülesanded õppimise tulemuslikkuse parandamiseks ei ole täielikult uuritud. Teadmiste destilleerimise raamistikul ja mitmeülesandeõppel põhinevas uuringus tutvustame sarnasuse meetrika mudelit abiülesandena, et parandada keeleülese NER-i tulemuslikkust sihtvaldkonnas. Täpsemalt koolitatakse üksuse tuvastajat ja sarnasuse hindajat paralleelselt kahe lähtedomeeni õpetajana. Seejärel juhivad need õpetajad samaaegselt kahte ülesannet õpilasmudelis. Kolme andmekogumi empiirilised uuringud seitsmes erinevas keeles kinnitavad kavandatud mudeli tõhusust.', 'fi': 'Monikielinen nimetty entiteettitunnistustehtﾃ､vﾃ､ on yksi kriittisistﾃ､ ongelmista arvioitaessa mahdollisia siirtooppimistekniikoita vﾃ､hﾃ､resurssisilla kielillﾃ､. Osaamisen tislaaminen esikoulutettujen monikielisten kielimallien avulla lﾃ､htﾃｶ- ja kohdekielten vﾃ､lillﾃ､ on osoittanut ylivoimansa siirron suhteen. Nykyisissﾃ､ monikielisissﾃ､ tislausmalleissa tarkastellaan kuitenkin vain mahdollisuutta siirtﾃ､ﾃ､ kahden samanlaisen yksittﾃ､isen tehtﾃ､vﾃ､n vﾃ､lillﾃ､ molemmilla aloilla. Muita mahdollisia aputehtﾃ､viﾃ､ oppimiskyvyn parantamiseksi ei ole tutkittu tﾃ､ysin. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tutkimuksessa esitellﾃ､ﾃ､n tietﾃ､myksen tislauksen viitekehykseen ja monitehtﾃ､vﾃ､oppimiseen perustuva samankaltaisuusmetrinen malli aputehtﾃ､vﾃ､nﾃ､ monikielisen NER-suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi kohdealueella. Yksikﾃｶntunnistaja ja samankaltaisuuden arvioija koulutetaan ensin rinnakkain kahdeksi opettajaksi lﾃ､hdealueelta. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n jﾃ､lkeen opettajat valvovat samanaikaisesti kahta opiskelijamallin tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､. Empiiriset tutkimukset kolmesta aineistosta seitsemﾃ､llﾃ､ eri kielellﾃ､ vahvistavat ehdotetun mallin tehokkuuden.', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates Rasane Bilih politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sistem bener yèn ngerti kanggo nggawe akeh pengguna mlebu In this test, basic on the knowingDistruction frame and multi-task Learning, we Intruse the Simlarity Metric model as an help task to advance the interlanguage NeR success on the goal domain. CURRENTCURRENT Amargi, saiki iki dadi ing model kuwi mau, dadi iki luwih apik bu kelas telu. Workspace', 'sk': 'Medjezična naloga prepoznavanja entitet je ena od ključnih težav pri ocenjevanju potencialnih tehnik prenosa učenja na jezikih z nizkimi viri. Destilacija znanja z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenih večjezičnih jezikovnih modelov med izvornimi in ciljnimi jeziki je pokazala svojo superiornost pri prenosu. Vendar obstoječi medjezični modeli destilacije zgolj upoštevajo možnost prenosljivosti med dvema enakima posameznima nalogama na obeh področjih. Druge možne pomožne naloge za izboljšanje učne uspešnosti niso bile v celoti raziskane. V tej študiji, ki temelji na okviru destilacije znanja in večopravilnem učenju, uvajamo model podobnosti kot pomožno nalogo za izboljšanje učinkovitosti medjezičnega NER na ciljni domeni. Natančneje, prepoznavalec entitete in ocenjevalec podobnosti se najprej vzporedno usposabljata kot dva učitelja iz domene vira. Nato ti učitelji hkrati nadzorujejo dve nalogi v študentskem modelu. Empirične študije na treh naborih podatkov v sedmih različnih jezikih potrjujejo učinkovitost predlaganega modela.', 'ha': "Suna cikin harshen-nau'in-nau'in sunan shaidar abun shine ɗayan mataimaki na muhimmi dõmin an evaluce masu yiwuwa da za'a iya amfani da masu iya amfani da kan lugha masu ƙaranci. Tsarin Sani da aka yi amfani da misãlai masu cikin harshen farko da aka yi wa zaman-tun mulki-lingui tsakanin source da ake amfani da shi sun nuna sifancinsu cikin transfer. A lokacin da ke da misãlai masu yin rarraba cikin lugha biyu kawai, sai ka ƙaddara muhimmin mai musanya a tsakanin aikin biyu masu daidaita guda biyu duk biyu. Other possible auxiliary tasks to improve the learning performance have not been fully investigated.  A cikin wannan lõkaci, a kan karatun firam na ilmi da karanta aiki masu yawa, za mu ƙara motel mai misãli da misalin metric kamar wani aikin adadi na adadi dõmin ya gyãra aikin na NER na fassarar-linguin-na'ura a kan komai. A ƙayyade, an sanar da wani mai gaskatãwa da mai ƙaddara daidaita, an sanar da shi farkon a sami da biyu masu macallin daga duk wuri. Sa'an nan, aikin biyu na cikin misalin ardayani na tsare su a sami guda. Ana karatun Empirical masu sakan taki uku a cikin wasu harshen 7 dabam-daban, suna gaskata fikancin misalin da aka buƙata.", 'he': 'משימה זיהוי ישויות בשם בין שפתיים היא אחת הבעיות הקריטיות להערכה את טכניקות ההעברה הפוטנציאלית על שפות משאבים נמוכות. דגימות שפה רבות מאומנות מראש בין שפות המקור לשפות המטרה הראו את העליון שלהם בהעברה. בכל אופן, דוגמני שטח חוצה שפתיים קיימים רק שוקלים את ההעברה הפוטנציאלית בין שתי משימות אחת זהות בכל שני תחומות. משימות נוספות נוספות אפשריות לשפר את ביצועי הלימוד לא חקרו באופן מלא. במחקר הזה, בהתבסס על סגרת הדיסטליה של הידע והלימוד במשימות רבות, אנו מכירים את הדוגמא המטרית של הדמיון כמשימה עזרית לשפר את ההופעה של NER בשפתיים על תחום המטרה. במיוחד, מזהה יחידה ומעריכת דמיון מאומנים לראשונה במקביל כשני מורים מתחום המקור. ואז, שתי משימות במודל הסטודנטים שולטות על ידי המורים האלה באותו זמן. מחקרים אימפריים על שלושת קבוצות נתונים בשבע שפות שונות מאשרים את היעילות של המודל המוצע.', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual named entity recognition task is one of the critical problems for evaluating the potential transfer techniques on low resource languages. སྔོན་གྲངས ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་རིགས་འདྲ་བརྗོད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཆོས་གཅིག་ལས་སྐྱེས་ལེན་ཐབས་རྒྱུ་ཡིན སློབ་གྲྭར་སྟངས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཞན་པ་ཚོས་གྲངས་སུ་གཏོང་མེད། In this study, based on the knowledge distillation framework and multi-task learning, we introduce the similarity metric model as an auxiliary task to improve the cross-lingual NER performance on the target domain. Specifically, an entity recognizer and a similarity evaluator are first trained in parallel as two teachers from the source domain. དེ་ནས་ཤོག་བྱས་པའི་མ་དབུགས་ནང་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་སློབ་འཛུགས་པ་ཚོ་སོ་སོ་སོར་བྱེད་ཡོད། སྐད་རིགས་མི་འདྲ་བར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞུང་གི་ཚགས་གསུམ་ལ་རྟོགས་བྱས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Explanation Graph Generation via Pre-trained Language Models: An Empirical Study with Contrastive Learning', 'ar': 'الطريقة العصبية الاحتمالية التمييزية المهمشة لتلخيص المستندات المتعددة للأدب الطبي', 'es': 'Método neuronal probabilístico discriminativo marginado para el resumen de varios documentos de la literatura médica', 'fr': 'Méthode neurale probabiliste marginalisée discriminante pour la synthèse multi-documents de littérature médicale', 'pt': 'Método Neural Probabilístico Marginalizado Discriminativo para Resumo Multidocumento de Literatura Médica', 'ja': '医学文献のマルチドキュメント要約のための判別的過疎化された確率的ニューラルメソッド', 'zh': '用医学文献多文档总判别性边缘化概率神经法', 'hi': 'चिकित्सा साहित्य के बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए भेदभावपूर्ण हाशिए पर संभावित संभाव्य तंत्रिका विधि', 'ru': 'Дискриминационный маргинализованный вероятностный нейронный метод для многодокументного обобщения медицинской литературы', 'ga': 'Modh Néarach Dóchúil Imeallach Idirdhealaitheach chun Achoimre Ildhoiciméad a dhéanamh ar Litríocht Leighis', 'hu': 'Diszkriminatív Marginalizált Valószínűleg Neurális Módszer az orvosi irodalom többdokumentumos összefoglalására', 'ka': 'დისკრიმინალური მარჯინალური შესაბამისი ნეიროლური მეტი მრავალური დოკუმენტის კომპანიზაციაზე', 'el': 'Διακριτική περιθωριοποιημένη Πιθανιστική Νευρική Μέθοδος για Πολυέγγραφη Σύνοψη της Ιατρικής Λογοτεχνίας', 'kk': 'Дискриминалдық Маргинализациялық ықтималдық нейрондық әдіс көп құжаттардың медициналдық әдебиеттердің тұжырымдамасы', 'mk': 'Дискриминативен маргинализиран веројатен неврален метод за резултат на медицинската литература со повеќе документи', 'it': 'Metodo Neurale Probabilistico Marginalizzato Discriminatorio per la Sintesi Multi-Documento della Letteratura Medica', 'lt': 'Diskriminacinis marginalizuotas tikėtinas neurologinis metodas daugiadokumentams medicininės literatūros santraukoms apibendrinti', 'ms': 'Discriminative Marginalized Probabilistic Neural Method for Multi-Document Summarization of Medical Literature', 'ml': 'മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ലിറ്ററേറ്ററിയുടെ പല രേഖയുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Metodu Newrali Probabilistiku Marġinalizzat Diskriminattiv għas-Sommarju Multi-Dokumentat tal-Litteratura Medika', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн хэмжээний эмнэлгийн соёл зохиолын олон бичлэгийн хувьд', 'ro': 'Metoda neurală probabilistică marginalizată discriminatorie pentru rezumarea literaturii medicale în mai multe documente', 'pl': 'Dyskryminacyjna marginalizowana prawdopodobna metoda neuronowa dla podsumowania literatury medycznej', 'no': 'Discriminate Marginalisert Probabilistic Neural Method for Multi-Document Summarization of Medical Literature', 'so': 'Discriminative Marginalized Probabilistic Neural Method for Multi-Document Summarization of Medical Literature', 'si': 'විශ්වාස කරපු මාර්ජිනලායිස් සංභාවිත න්\u200dයායාලික විද්\u200dයාව විද්\u200dයාව සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාව විද', 'sv': 'Diskriminerande marginaliserad sannolik neural metod för flerdokumentssammanfattning av medicinsk litteratur', 'ta': 'பல- ஆவணங்கள் சுருக்கமாக்கத்திற்கான வித்தியாசமான முறைமை', 'sr': 'дискриминално маргинализирано вероятно неврално метод за многодокументски резамирање медицинске литературе', 'ur': 'مختلف دکھانے کے لئے مختلف دکھانے والی مصنوعی صحیح کی جمع کرنا کے لئے محاسبات نیورال طریقہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Áp lực Biên giới Có khả năng thần kinh đa tài liệu cho tổng hợp văn học y học', 'nl': 'Discriminatieve Marginaliseerde Probabilistische Neurale Methode voor Multi-Document Samenvatting van Medische Literatuur', 'bg': 'Дискриминативен маргинализиран вероятен неврален метод за обобщаване на медицинската литература', 'da': 'Diskriminerende Marginaliseret Probabilistisk Neural Metode til Multi-Document Summarisation af Medicinsk Litteratur', 'id': 'Discriminative Marginalized Probabilistic Neural Method for Multi-Document Summarization of Medical Literature', 'ko': '의학 문헌 다중 문서 요약의 판별 변두리화 확률 신경 네트워크 방법', 'de': 'Diskriminierende marginalisierte probabilistische neuronale Methode zur dokumentarischen Zusammenfassung medizinischer Literatur', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Kipinduzi wa Utawala wa Utawala wa Utawala', 'fa': 'روش عصبی احتمالات جدایی برای جمع کردن مدرسه های زیادی از مدرسه پزشکی', 'tr': 'Çoklu Sened Edebiýatynyň Iň Koplamasy üçin Nagt Maglumaty Marjinaly Jekirli Metini', 'af': 'Diskriminasie Marginaliseerde Probabilistice Neurale Metode vir Multi-Document Opsomming van Mediese Literaat', 'sq': 'Metoda Neurale e Ndoshtatshme Marginalizuar Diskriminuese për Somarizimin e Literaturës Mjekësore Multi-Dokumentore', 'am': 'እና', 'hr': 'Diskriminirana Marginalizirana vjerojatnost neuronska metoda za sažetak više dokumenta medicinske književnosti', 'az': '䷃뱸瓉饬楦⁄즙獴즙汩欠䕤敢楹慴쒱滄녮⁂楲揉餭䓉饳瓉饬楫⁔潰污얟擄녲浡珄넊', 'hy': 'Բժշկական գրականության բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման դիսկրմինալիզացված հավանական նյարդային մեթոդը', 'bn': 'মেডিকেল সাহিত্যের সামার্জারেশনের জন্য বৈষম্যিক সম্ভাব্য নিউরাল মাধ্যম', 'bs': 'Diskriminirana Marginalizirana verovatnoća neuronska metoda za sažetak više dokumenta medicinske literature', 'ca': 'Métode neuronal marginat discriminatiu per a resumir la literatura mèdica multidocumental', 'cs': 'Diskriminační marginalizovaná pravděpodobně neurální metoda pro multidokumentní shrnutí lékařské literatury', 'et': 'Diskrimineeriv marginaalne tõenäoline neuromeetod meditsiinikirjanduse mitmekordseks kokkuvõtteks', 'fi': 'Syrjintävä Marginalized Probabilistic Neural Method for Multi-Document Summarization of Medical Literature', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Diskrim-Marjinalizasi Method Neralistik Dijewisan kanggo Keteraturasi Multi-Dokumen', 'sk': 'Diskriminativna Marginalizirana verjetna nevralna metoda za povzetek večdokumentov medicinske literature', 'he': 'שיטת נוירולית סבירה מרגינליזת דיסקרימינליזציה לסימנות רפואית במספר מסמכים רבים', 'bo': 'Discriminative Marginalized Probabilistic Neural Method for Multi-Document Summarization of Medical Literature'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained sequence-to-sequence language models have led to widespread success in many natural language generation tasks. However, there has been relatively less work on analyzing their ability to generate structured outputs such as graphs. Unlike natural language, graphs have distinct structural and semantic properties in the context of a downstream NLP task, e.g., generating a graph that is connected and acyclic can be attributed to its structural constraints, while the semantics of a graph can refer to how meaningfully an edge represents the relation between two node concepts. In this work, we study pre-trained language models that generate explanation graphs in an end-to-end manner and analyze their ability to learn the structural constraints and semantics of such graphs. We first show that with limited supervision, pre-trained language models often generate graphs that either violate these constraints or are semantically incoherent. Since curating large amount of human-annotated graphs is expensive and tedious, we propose simple yet effective ways of graph perturbations via node and edge edit operations that lead to structurally and semantically positive and negative graphs. Next, we leverage these graphs in different contrastive learning models with Max-Margin and InfoNCE losses. Our methods lead to significant improvements in both structural and semantic accuracy of explanation graphs and also generalize to other similar graph generation tasks. Lastly, we show that human errors are the best negatives for contrastive learning and also that automatically generating more such human-like negative graphs can lead to further improvements.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من أن الحلول الحالية المستندة إلى المحولات نجحت في نطاق واسع لمهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية للوثيقة الواحدة ، إلا أنها لا تزال تكافح لمعالجة المهام متعددة المدخلات مثل تلخيص المستندات المتعددة. تقطع العديد من الحلول المدخلات ، وبالتالي تتجاهل المحتويات المحتملة ذات الصلة بالملخص ، وهو أمر غير مقبول في المجال الطبي حيث يمكن أن تكون كل معلومة حيوية. يستفيد البعض الآخر من تقريب النموذج الخطي لتطبيق التسلسل متعدد المدخلات ، مما يؤدي إلى تفاقم النتائج لأن جميع المعلومات يتم أخذها في الاعتبار ، حتى لو كانت متضاربة أو صاخبة فيما يتعلق بالخلفية المشتركة. على الرغم من أهمية الطب وتأثيره الاجتماعي ، لا توجد حلول مخصصة للتلخيص متعدد الوثائق. لهذا السبب ، نقترح طريقة احتمالية هامشية تمييزية جديدة (DAMEN) تم تدريبها على تمييز المعلومات الهامة من مجموعة من المستندات الطبية ذات الصلة بالموضوع وإنشاء ملخص متعدد المستندات عبر تهميش احتمالية رمزية. تثبت النتائج أننا تفوقنا في الأداء على أحدث التقنيات السابقة في مجموعة بيانات طبية حيوية لتلخيص متعدد المستندات لمراجعات الأدبيات المنهجية. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بإجراء دراسات استئصال مكثفة لتحفيز خيارات التصميم وإثبات أهمية كل وحدة من طريقتنا.', 'fr': "Bien que les solutions actuelles de pointe basées sur Transformer aient réussi un large éventail de tâches de NLP à document unique, elles ont encore du mal à traiter les tâches à entrées multiples telles que la synthèse de plusieurs documents. De nombreuses solutions tronquent les entrées, ignorant ainsi les contenus potentiellement pertinents pour les résumés, ce qui est inacceptable dans le domaine médical où chaque information peut être vitale. D'autres utilisent des approximations de modèles linéaires pour appliquer une concaténation à entrées multiples, ce qui aggrave les résultats parce que toutes les informations sont prises en compte, même si elles sont conflictuelles ou bruyantes par rapport à un arrière-plan partagé. Malgré l'importance et l'impact social de la médecine, il n'existe pas de solutions ad hoc pour la synthèse de plusieurs documents. Pour cette raison, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode probabiliste marginalisée discriminative (DAMEN) formée pour discriminer les informations critiques d'un groupe de documents médicaux liés à un sujet et générer un résumé multi-documents via la marginalisation de probabilité symbolique. Les résultats prouvent que nous surpassons les dernières avancées sur un ensemble de données biomédicales pour la synthèse multi-documents des revues de littérature systématiques. De plus, nous réalisons des études d'ablation approfondies pour motiver les choix de conception et prouver l'importance de chaque module de notre méthode.", 'pt': 'Embora as soluções atuais baseadas em Transformer de última geração tenham sido bem-sucedidas em uma ampla gama de tarefas de NLP de documento único, elas ainda lutam para lidar com tarefas de várias entradas, como sumarização de vários documentos. Muitas soluções truncam as entradas, ignorando possíveis conteúdos relevantes para o resumo, o que é inaceitável no domínio médico, onde cada informação pode ser vital. Outros utilizam aproximações de modelos lineares para aplicar concatenação multi-entradas, piorando os resultados porque todas as informações são consideradas, mesmo que sejam conflitantes ou ruidosas em relação a um fundo compartilhado. Apesar da importância e do impacto social da medicina, não existem soluções ad-hoc para a sumarização de vários documentos. Por esse motivo, propomos um novo método probabilístico marginalizado discriminativo (DAMEN) treinado para discriminar informações críticas de um conjunto de documentos médicos relacionados a tópicos e gerar um resumo de vários documentos por meio de marginalização de probabilidade de token. Os resultados provam que superamos o estado da arte anterior em um conjunto de dados biomédicos para resumo de vários documentos de revisões sistemáticas da literatura. Além disso, realizamos extensos estudos de ablação para motivar as escolhas de design e comprovar a importância de cada módulo do nosso método.', 'es': 'Si bien las soluciones actuales basadas en Transformer de última generación tuvieron éxito en una amplia gama de tareas de PNL de un solo documento, todavía tienen dificultades para abordar tareas de entrada múltiple, como la sumarización de varios documentos. Muchas soluciones truncan las entradas, ignorando así los posibles contenidos relevantes para el resumen, lo cual es inaceptable en el dominio médico, donde cada información puede ser vital. Otros aprovechan las aproximaciones de modelos lineales para aplicar la concatenación de múltiples entradas, lo que empeora los resultados porque se tiene en cuenta toda la información, incluso si es conflictiva o ruidosa con respecto a un fondo compartido. A pesar de la importancia y el impacto social de la medicina, no existen soluciones ad hoc para el resumen de varios documentos. Por esta razón, proponemos un novedoso método probabilístico discriminativo marginalizado (DAMEN) entrenado para discriminar información crítica de un grupo de documentos médicos relacionados con el tema y generar un resumen de varios documentos a través de la marginación de probabilidad simbólica. Los resultados demuestran que superamos el estado de la técnica anterior en un conjunto de datos biomédicos para el resumen de múltiples documentos de revisiones sistemáticas de la literatura. Además, realizamos extensos estudios de ablación para motivar las elecciones de diseño y demostrar la importancia de cada módulo de nuestro método.', 'ja': '現在の最先端のTransformerベースのソリューションは、単一文書のNLPタスクのために幅広い範囲で成功しましたが、マルチ文書の要約などのマルチ入力タスクに対処するのに苦労しています。 多くのソリューションは入力を切り捨てるため、概要に関連する潜在的な内容を無視します。これは、各情報が重要である可能性のある医療領域では受け入れられません。 他の人は、線形モデルの近似を利用してマルチ入力の連結を適用し、結果を悪化させます。これは、共有されたバックグラウンドに関して競合または騒音がある場合でも、すべての情報が考慮されるためです。 医学の重要性と社会的影響にもかかわらず、マルチドキュメントの要約のためのアドホックなソリューションはありません。 このため、トピック関連の医療文書のクラスターから重要な情報を識別し、トークン確率過疎化を介してマルチドキュメントの要約を生成するようにトレーニングされた、新規の差別化された過疎化された確率的方法（ DAMEN ）を提案します。 結果は、系統的な文献レビューのマルチドキュメント要約のための生物医学データセットで、私たちが以前の最先端を凌駕していることを証明しています。 さらに、設計の選択を動機づけ、方法の各モジュールの重要性を証明するために、広範囲にわたるアブレーション研究を実施しています。', 'hi': 'यद्यपि वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित समाधान एकल-दस्तावेज़ NLP कार्यों के लिए एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला में सफल रहे, फिर भी वे बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण जैसे बहु-इनपुट कार्यों को संबोधित करने के लिए संघर्ष करते हैं। कई समाधान इनपुट को छोटा करते हैं, इस प्रकार संभावित सारांश-प्रासंगिक सामग्री की अनदेखी करते हैं, जो चिकित्सा डोमेन में अस्वीकार्य है जहां प्रत्येक जानकारी महत्वपूर्ण हो सकती है। अन्य बहु-इनपुट संयोजन लागू करने के लिए रैखिक मॉडल सन्निकटन का लाभ उठाते हैं, परिणामों को खराब करते हैं क्योंकि सभी जानकारी पर विचार किया जाता है, भले ही यह साझा पृष्ठभूमि के संबंध में परस्पर विरोधी या शोर हो। चिकित्सा के महत्व और सामाजिक प्रभाव के बावजूद, बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए कोई तदर्थ समाधान नहीं हैं। इस कारण से, हम एक उपन्यास भेदभावपूर्ण हाशिए पर संभावित विधि (DAMEN) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो विषय से संबंधित चिकित्सा दस्तावेजों के एक समूह से महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी को भेदभाव करने और टोकन संभाव्यता हाशिए के माध्यम से एक बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांश उत्पन्न करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित है। परिणाम साबित करते हैं कि हम व्यवस्थित साहित्य समीक्षाओं के बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए बायोमेडिकल डेटासेट पर पिछले राज्य-कला से आगे निकलते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम डिजाइन विकल्पों को प्रेरित करने और हमारी विधि के प्रत्येक मॉड्यूल के महत्व को साबित करने के लिए व्यापक एब्लेशन अध्ययन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Несмотря на то, что современные решения на основе трансформаторов успешно решают широкий спектр задач NLP с одним документом, они все еще сталкиваются с трудностями при решении задач с несколькими входами, таких как обобщение нескольких документов. Многие решения усекают входные данные, игнорируя тем самым потенциальное содержание, связанное с резюме, что неприемлемо в медицинской области, где каждая информация может быть жизненно важной. Другие используют аппроксимации линейной модели для применения многовходной конкатенации, ухудшая результаты, потому что вся информация рассматривается, даже если она противоречива или шумна по отношению к общему фону. Несмотря на важность и социальное воздействие медицины, не существует специальных решений для обобщения нескольких документов. По этой причине мы предлагаем новый дискриминационный маргинальный вероятностный метод (DAMEN), обученный различать критическую информацию из кластера медицинских документов, связанных с темой, и генерировать краткое изложение нескольких документов посредством маргинальной маргинализации вероятности. Результаты доказывают, что мы превосходим предыдущий уровень в наборе биомедицинских данных для краткого изложения систематических обзоров литературы в нескольких документах. Кроме того, мы проводим обширные исследования абляции, чтобы мотивировать выбор дизайна и доказать важность каждого модуля нашего метода.', 'zh': '虽先进之Transformer解决方案功成于单文档NLP,犹难以解决多输,如多文档摘要。 诸解决方案断输,而忽于摘要者,不可受也,信之至也。 其他用线性模近似以多输串联,使终恶化者,以所有信息,虽与共享背景冲突嘈杂也。 虽医有要害,然于多文档摘要,未有临时之解决方案。 由此言之,新歧视性边缘化概率(DAMEN)术,训练可以相关文档要信息,因令牌概率边缘化生多文档摘要。 然则生物医学数集上优于前最先进之术,以统文献综述之多文档摘要。 博烧蚀研究,以激选择,明吾模块之要。', 'ga': 'Cé gur éirigh le réitigh nua-aimseartha atá bunaithe ar an gClaochladán le raon leathan de thascanna NLP aon-doiciméad a dhéanamh, bíonn siad fós ag streachailt le tabhairt faoi thascanna il-ionchuir ar nós achoimre ildhoiciméad. Is iomaí réiteach a ghearrann na hionchuir, rud a fhágann neamhaird ar inneachar ionchasach a bhaineann le hachomair, rud atá do-ghlactha sa réimse leighis áit ar féidir le gach faisnéis a bheith ríthábhachtach. Déanann daoine eile comhfhogasú líneach ar shamhail a ghiaráil chun comhghaolú il-ionchuir a chur i bhfeidhm, ag dul in olcas na dtorthaí toisc go ndéantar an fhaisnéis go léir a mheas, fiú má tá sí contrártha nó torannach maidir le cúlra comhroinnte. In ainneoin tábhacht agus tionchar sóisialta na míochaine, níl aon réitigh ad-hoc ann maidir le hachoimriú ildhoiciméad. Ar an ábhar sin, molaimid modh nua dóchúlacht imeallaithe idirdhealaitheach (DAMEN) atá oilte chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh ar fhaisnéis chriticiúil ó bhraisle doiciméad leighis a bhaineann le topaicí agus chun achoimre ilchoiciméad a ghiniúint trí imeallú dóchúlachta comharthaí. Cruthaíonn torthaí go bhfuil níos fearr againn ná an ceann is déanaí ar thacar sonraí bithleighis chun achoimriú ildhoiciméad a dhéanamh ar léirmheasanna córasacha litríochta. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid staidéar fairsing ar ablation chun na roghanna dearaidh a spreagadh agus chun an tábhacht a bhaineann le gach modúl dár modh a chruthú.', 'hu': 'Bár a jelenlegi, korszerű transzformátor-alapú megoldások széles skálát sikerültek az egydokumentumos NLP feladatokhoz, mégis nehezen kezelik a többbeviteli feladatokat, mint például a többdokumentumos összefoglalás. Számos megoldás lerövidíti a bemeneteket, így figyelmen kívül hagyja a potenciális összefoglaló-releváns tartalmakat, ami elfogadhatatlan az orvosi területen, ahol minden információ létfontosságú lehet. Mások lineáris modellközelítéseket használnak a többbemeneti összefüggések alkalmazásához, rontva az eredményeket, mert minden információt figyelembe vesznek, még akkor is, ha ellentmondásos vagy zajos a megosztott háttér tekintetében. Az orvostudomány fontossága és társadalmi hatása ellenére nincsenek ad hoc megoldások a többdokumentumos összefoglalásra. Ezért egy új diszkriminatív marginalizált valószínűségi módszert (DAMEN) javasolunk, amely arra képzett, hogy megkülönböztesse a kritikus információkat a témakörrel kapcsolatos orvosi dokumentumok klaszteréből, és többdokumentumos összefoglalót készítsen token valószínűségi marginalizációval. Az eredmények azt bizonyítják, hogy a szisztematikus szakirodalmi felülvizsgálatok többdokumentumos összefoglalásához szükséges orvosbiológiai adatkészleten túlléptük a korábbi korszerű teljesítményt. Emellett kiterjedt ablációs tanulmányokat végzünk, hogy motiváljuk a tervezési választásokat és bizonyítsuk módszerünk minden moduljának fontosságát.', 'el': 'Παρά το γεγονός ότι οι τρέχουσες λύσεις που βασίζονται στον μετασχηματιστή πέτυχαν σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εργασιών ενός εγγράφου, εξακολουθούν να αγωνίζονται να αντιμετωπίσουν εργασίες πολλαπλών εισόδων, όπως η σύνοψη πολλών εγγράφων. Πολλές λύσεις περικόπτουν τις εισόδους, αγνοώντας έτσι πιθανά περιεκτικά σχετικά με σύνοψη, πράγμα που είναι απαράδεκτο στον ιατρικό τομέα όπου κάθε πληροφορία μπορεί να είναι ζωτικής σημασίας. Άλλοι χρησιμοποιούν προσεγγίσεις γραμμικών μοντέλων για να εφαρμόσουν αλληλουχία πολλαπλών εισόδων, επιδεινώνοντας τα αποτελέσματα επειδή λαμβάνονται υπόψη όλες οι πληροφορίες, ακόμη και αν είναι αντιφατικές ή θορυβώδεις σε σχέση με ένα κοινό υπόβαθρο. Παρά τη σημασία και τον κοινωνικό αντίκτυπο της ιατρικής, δεν υπάρχουν λύσεις ad hoc για συνοπτική παρουσίαση πολλαπλών εγγράφων. Για το λόγο αυτό, προτείνουμε μια νέα διακριτική περιθωριοποιημένη πιθανολογική μέθοδο (DAMEN) εκπαιδευμένη για να διακρίνει κρίσιμες πληροφορίες από ένα σύμπλεγμα ιατρικών εγγράφων που σχετίζονται με θέματα και να δημιουργήσει μια περίληψη πολλαπλών εγγράφων μέσω περιθωριοποίησης συμβολικής πιθανότητας. Τα αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν ότι ξεπερνάμε την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας σε ένα βιοϊατρικό σύνολο δεδομένων για την περίληψη πολλαπλών εγγράφων συστηματικών ανασκοπήσεων βιβλιογραφίας. Επιπλέον, διεξάγουμε εκτεταμένες μελέτες αφαίρεσης για να παρακινήσουμε τις σχεδιαστικές επιλογές και να αποδείξουμε τη σημασία κάθε ενότητας της μεθόδου μας.', 'ka': 'თუმცა მიმდინარე განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრება განსაზღვრებულია ერთი დოკუმენტის NLP დავალებებისთვის განსაზღვრებულია, ისინი უკვე მრავალური დავალებებისთვის შესაძლებელია, როგორც მრავალური დოკ ბევრი გარეშე შეუძლებელია მონაცემების შესახებ, რადგან პოცენტალური შესახებ შესახებ მნიშვნელოვანი შესახებ, რომელიც მედიცინური დიომინში არ მიღებელია, სადაც ყო სხვა მოდელური მოდელური დაბრუნებები, რაც მრავალური დაბრუნებული მოდელური დაბრუნებისთვის გამოყენება, შემდეგ შემდეგი შემდეგი გაზრუნება, რადგან ყველა ინფორმაცია იფიქრობიან, თუ მედიცინის მნიშვნელობა და სოციალური შედეგების განმავლობას მაგრამ, მრავალური დოკუმენტის კუმენტურაციისთვის არ არის ad-hoc გახსნა. ამის მიზეზით, ჩვენ ახალი დისკრიმინატიური მარტინალიზეტიური პრობლემენტიური მეთოდი (DAMEN) დავიწყებთ კრიტიური ინფორმაციის დისკრიმინაციის კლასტრიდან მედიციური დოკუმენტების კოსტრიდან და მრავალე დოკუ წარმოდგენები გამოწვება, რომ ჩვენ წინა წარმოდგენების ბიომედიციური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში სისტემატიკური ლიტერატურის რედაქტირებისთვის გავაკეთებთ. დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ძალიან ძალიან შესაძლებელი სწავლობა, რომ მოტივირთოთ დიზაინის მონიშნულები და ჩვენი მეტის ყველა მოდულის მნიშვნელობა.', 'it': "Sebbene le attuali soluzioni basate su Transformer siano riuscite in una vasta gamma di attività NLP a singolo documento, esse hanno ancora difficoltà ad affrontare attività multi-input come la sintesi multi-documento. Molte soluzioni troncano gli input, ignorando così potenziali contenuti di sintesi rilevanti, che è inaccettabile nel campo medico dove ogni informazione può essere vitale. Altri sfruttano approssimazioni lineari dei modelli per applicare concatenazioni multi-input, peggiorando i risultati perché tutte le informazioni sono considerate, anche se sono conflittuali o rumorose rispetto a uno sfondo condiviso. Nonostante l'importanza e l'impatto sociale della medicina, non esistono soluzioni ad hoc per la sintesi multi-documento. Per questo motivo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo discriminativo marginalizzato probabilistico (DAMEN) addestrato a discriminare le informazioni critiche da un cluster di documenti medici relativi all'argomento e generare un riassunto multi-documento attraverso l'emarginazione di probabilità token. I risultati dimostrano che abbiamo superato lo stato dell'arte precedente su un set di dati biomedici per la sintesi multi-documento di revisioni sistematiche della letteratura. Inoltre, eseguiamo ampi studi di ablazione per motivare le scelte progettuali e dimostrare l'importanza di ogni modulo del nostro metodo.", 'kk': 'Қолданыстағы NLP тапсырмалар үшін бір құжатты NLP тапсырмаларының көбірек аумағындағы түрлендірушінің негізінде шешулері жаңылыс болса да, олар бірнеше құжатты тұжырымдау секілді көбірек келтіру тап Көп шешім келтірілгендерді күшейтеді, сондықтан әрбір мәлімет маңызды болатын медицина доменінде қабылдамайды, бұл мүмкін тұжырымдық мазмұнын елемейді. Басқалар бірнеше келтірілген бірнеше келтірілген біріктіру үшін сызық үлгілерді жақсарту үшін, нәтижелерді жақсарту үшін, себебі барлық мәліметтер ортақтастырылған аясына қарсы немесе дыбыс Құжаттардың маңызды және әлемдік нәтижесіне қарамастан, көп құжатты жазылу үшін ad-hoc шешімдері жоқ. Бұл себептен біз жаңа дискриминациялық маргиналық ықтималдық (DAMEN) әдісін тақырыпты медициналық құжаттардың кластерінен бөлек мәліметті бөлек айналдыру үшін, көптеген құжаттың тұжырымдамасын таңдап, таңдау ы Нәтижелер біз бірнеше құжаттарды жүйелік литератураларды қарау үшін бірнеше медицински деректер қорларының алдыңғы орындауын көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, біз дизайнның таңдауларын мотивациялау үшін жұмыс істеу зерттеулерін жұмыс істеп, әрбір әдімінің маңыздығын көрсету үшін.', 'lt': 'Nors dabartiniai moderniausi Transformuotojais pagrįsti sprendimai sėkmingai pasiekė platų vieno dokumento NLP užduočių spektrą, jie vis dar stengiasi spręsti daugelio įnašų užduotis, pvz., daugelio dokumentų santrauką. Daugelis sprendimų sutrumpina įvedimus ir taip ignoruoja galimą santraukos turinį, kuris yra nepriimtinas medicinos srityje, kurioje kiekviena informacija gali būti gyvybiškai svarbi. Kiti sutelkia linijinio modelio suderinimus, kad būtų galima taikyti daugialypį suvienodinimą, todėl rezultatai pablogėja, nes visa informacija laikoma, net jei ji prieštarauja arba triukšminga, atsižvelgiant į bendrą foną. Nepaisant medicinos svarbos ir socialinio poveikio, nėra ad hoc sprendimų daugiadokumentams apibendrinti. Dėl šios priežasties siūlome naują diskriminacinį marginalizuotą probabilistinį metodą (DAMEN), parengtą diskriminuoti kritinę informaciją iš su tema susijusių medicininių dokumentų grupės ir parengti daugelio dokumentų santrauką naudojant token probability marginalization. Rezultatai rodo, kad esame labiau pažangi už biomedicinos duomenų rinkinį, skirtą sisteminėms literatūros apžvalgoms apibendrinti daugiadokumentais. Be to, atliekame išsamius abliacijos tyrimus, kad motyvuotume projektavimo pasirinkimus ir įrodytume kiekvieno mūsų metodo modulio svarbą.', 'mk': 'Иако сегашните најсовремени трансформски решенија успеаа во широк опсег за задачи со еден документ на НЛП, тие сé уште се борат да се справат со мултивнесени задачи како што е резултатот на мултидокументите. Многу решенија ги скратуваат внесувањата, игнорирајќи ја потенцијалната содржина релевантна за сумирање, што е неприфатливо во медицинскиот домен каде секоја информација може да биде важна. Другите ги влијаат линијарните приближувања на моделот за да се применат мултивметни концентрации, влошувајќи ги резултатите бидејќи се сметаат за сите информации, дури и ако се конфликтираат или бучат во однос на заедничката позадина. И покрај важноста и социјалното влијание на медицината, нема адхок решенија за мултидокументарна резултатација. Од оваа причина, предложуваме нов дискриминативен маргинализиран веројатностен метод (ДАМЕН) обучен за дискриминација на критични информации од група медицински документи поврзани со темата и генерирање на мултидокумент резиме преку маргинализација на веројат Резултатите докажуваат дека ја надминуваме претходната најнова состојба на биомедицинските податоци за мултидокументарна резимизација на систематски литератури. Покрај тоа, спроведуваме широки студии на аблација за мотивирање на изборите за дизајн и докажување на важноста на секој модул на нашиот метод.', 'ms': 'Walaupun penyelesaian berasaskan Transformer-state-of-the-art semasa berjaya dalam julat luas untuk tugas NLP dokumen tunggal, mereka masih berjuang untuk mengatasi tugas input-berbilang seperti ringkasan dokumen berbilang. Banyak penyelesaian memotong input, jadi mengabaikan kandungan berkaitan-ringkasan potensi, yang tidak dapat diterima dalam domain perubatan di mana setiap maklumat boleh menjadi penting. Lain-lain menggunakan pendekatan model linear untuk melaksanakan penyesalan input-berbilang, memperburuk keputusan kerana semua maklumat dianggap, walaupun ia berkonflik atau bunyi terhadap latar belakang terkongsi. Walaupun penting dan kesan sosial perubatan, tiada solusi ad-hoc untuk ringkasan multi-dokumen. Untuk sebab ini, kami melaporkan kaedah kemungkinan marginalisasi diskriminatif (DAMEN) yang dilatih untuk diskriminasi maklumat kritik dari kumpulan dokumen perubatan berkaitan topik dan menghasilkan ringkasan multi-dokumen melalui marginalisasi kemungkinan token. Hasil membuktikan kita melampaui keadaan-state-of-the-art terdahulu pada set data biomedikal untuk ringkasan multi-dokumen ulasan sastra sistemik. Selain itu, kami melakukan kajian ablasi yang luas untuk mendorong pilihan desain dan membuktikan penting setiap modul kaedah kami.', 'mt': 'Għalkemm is-soluzzjonijiet attwali l-aktar avvanzati bbażati fuq it-Trasformer irnexxielhom f’firxa wiesgħa għal kompiti NLP b’dokument wieħed, xorta għadhom qed ibatu biex jindirizzaw kompiti b’ħafna input bħal sommarju ta’ diversi dokumenti. Ħafna soluzzjonijiet iqassru l-inputs, u b’hekk jinjoraw il-kontenut potenzjali rilevanti għas-sommarju, li mhuwiex aċċettabbli fil-qasam mediku fejn kull informazzjoni tista’ tkun vitali. Others leverage linear model approximations to apply multi-input concatenation, worsening the results because all information is considered, even if it is conflicting or noisy with respect to a shared background.  Minkejja l-importanza u l-impatt soċjali tal-mediċina, m’hemmx soluzzjonijiet ad hoc għas-sommarju ta’ diversi dokumenti. Għal din ir-raġuni, qed nipproponu metodu ta’ probabbiltà marġinalizzat diskriminatorju ġdid (DAMEN) imħarreġ biex jiddiskrimina informazzjoni kritika minn raggruppament ta’ dokumenti mediċi relatati mas-suġġett u jiġġenera sommarju multidokumenti permezz ta’ marġinalizzazzjoni tal-probabbiltà tat-token. Ir-riżultati juru li a ħna qed nagħmlu l-aktar avvanzati preċedenti fuq sett ta’ dejta bijomedika għal sommarju ta’ diversi dokumenti ta’ reviżjonijiet sistematiċi tal-letteratura. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu studji estensivi dwar l-ablazzjoni biex nimmotivaw l-għażliet tad-disinn u nippruvaw l-importanza ta’ kull modulu tal-metodu tagħna.', 'mn': 'Гэхдээ одоогийн урлагийн түвшинд суурилсан шийдэлүүд NLP-ийн ажлын тухай өргөн хэсэгт амжилттай байсан ч, олон баримт нийлүүлэх мэт олон-орлуулсан ажлыг удирдах зорилгодог. Ихэнх шийдэл үүнийг багасгаж байна. Иймээс мэдээлэл бүр чухал байж болох эмнэлгийн хэлбэрээр хүлээн зөвшөөрөхгүй байдаг. Учир нь бусад нь олон орнуудын тодорхойлолтыг ашиглах шулуун загварын ойролцоог ашиглаж, үр дүнг муу болгож, учир нь бүх мэдээллийг хуваалцсан хэсгийг харьцуулж байгаа ч гэсэн, бүх мэдээллийг зөрчилдөөн эсвэл шууд Эдийн чухал болон нийгмийн нөлөө үзүүлэхэд гадна олон баримт хэвлэхэд ad-hoc шийдэл байхгүй. Ийм шалтгаанаас бид сэдвээс холбогдсон эмнэлгийн баримтуудыг хуваалцахын тулд шинэ хуваалцах боломжтой боломжтой арга замыг (DAMEN) санал болгож, олон баримтуудын хуваалцаа гаргадаг. Үүний үр дүнд бид системийн уран зохиолын шалгалтын олон баримт олон биологийн эмнэлгийн өгөгдлийн санд өмнө уран зохиолын байдлыг баталдаг. Мөн бид загварын сонголтыг урам зориулахын тулд маш их хүчтэй судалгаа хийдэг. Мөн бидний арга загварын тухай чухал зүйлийг баталдаг.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതി- ആർട്ട് ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള പരിഹാരങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വിശാലമായ രേഖയില്\u200d വിജയിച്ചിരുന്നെങ്കിലും ഒരു രേ ഒരുപാട് പരിഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകളെ പിന്തുടരുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് സാധ്യതയുള്ള സംബന്ധിച്ചുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കം ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. അത് മെഡിക് Others leverage linear model approximations to apply multi-input concatenation, worsening the results because all information is considered, even if it is conflicting or noisy with respect to a shared background.  മരുന്നുകളുടെ പ്രധാനവും സാമൂഹ്യ പ്രഭാവവും ശേഷിച്ചാലും, പല രേഖകളുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പര അതിനുവേണ്ടിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവലിനെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത്, മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗസ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്. വിവരങ്ങളുമായ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും  ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തെളിയിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള രാജ്യത്തെ സാമ്പത്തികമായ സാഹിത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു ബൈയോമിക്കല്\u200d ഡാ അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മുടെ ഡിസൈന്\u200d തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാനും നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ എല്ലാ ഘടനയുടെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് തെളിയിക്കാനും', 'pl': 'Chociaż obecne najnowocześniejsze rozwiązania oparte na transformatorze udały się osiągnąć szeroki zakres zadań NLP pojedynczego dokumentu, wciąż trudno im rozwiązać zadania wielu wejść, takie jak podsumowanie wielu dokumentów. Wiele rozwiązań skraca dane wejściowe, ignorując tym samym potencjalne treści związane z podsumowaniem, co jest niedopuszczalne w dziedzinie medycznej, gdzie każda informacja może być istotna. Inne wykorzystują przybliżenia modeli liniowych, aby zastosować łączenie wielu wejść, pogarszając wyniki, ponieważ uwzględnia się wszystkie informacje, nawet jeśli są sprzeczne lub hałaśliwe w odniesieniu do wspólnego tła. Pomimo znaczenia i społecznego wpływu medycyny, nie ma rozwiązań ad hoc dla podsumowania wielu dokumentów. Z tego powodu proponujemy nową metodę dyskryminacyjną marginalizowaną probabilistyczną (DAMEN), przeszkoloną do rozróżniania informacji krytycznych z klastra tematycznych dokumentów medycznych i generowania podsumowania wielu dokumentów za pomocą marginalizacji prawdopodobieństwa tokenowego. Wyniki pokazują, że przewyższamy dotychczasowy state-of-the-art zbiór danych biomedycznych do podsumowania systematycznych przeglądów literatury. Ponadto przeprowadzamy obszerne badania ablacji, aby motywować do wyborów projektowych i udowodnić znaczenie każdego modułu naszej metody.', 'no': 'Selv om det gjeldande status-of-the-art Transformer-baserte løysingar vart vellukka i eit brett område for enkelt dokument NLP-oppgåver, kjem dei framleis til å adressa fleire inndata- oppgåver, slik som samansering av fleire dokument. Mange løsningar trukker inndata, slik at du ignorerer potensielle samandrag-relevante innhaldet, som er ikkje akseptabel i medisinske domene der kvar informasjon kan vera viktig. Andre tilnærmingar av lineær modell for å bruka fleire inndatasamlingar, fordi alle informasjonane vert vurderte, sjølv om det er konflikt eller støy med respekt til ein delt bakgrunn. Til tross viktigheten og sosiale effekten av medikamenter finst ingen ad-hoc løysing for samansering av fleire dokument. Dette grunnen foreslår vi eit nytt diskriminasjonsmetode marginaliserte sannsynlighetsmetode (DAMEN) som trengte for å diskriminasjona kritiske informasjon frå eit gruppe med temarelaterte medisinske dokument og laga ei sammendrag med fleire dokument gjennom sannsynlighetsmetode. Resultater viser at vi utfører den førre tilstanden av kunsten på ein biomedisinsk dataset for sammendraging av fleire dokument i systematiske literaturrekningar. I tillegg utfører vi utvida aktiveringsstudiar for å motivera design-val og bevise viktigheten for kvar modul av metoden vår.', 'ro': 'Deși soluțiile actuale bazate pe Transformer de ultimă generație au reușit într-o gamă largă pentru activitățile PNL cu un singur document, acestea încă se luptă să abordeze sarcini cu mai multe intrări, cum ar fi rezumarea mai multor documente. Multe soluții scurtează intrările, ignorând astfel potențialul conținut relevant pentru rezumat, ceea ce este inacceptabil în domeniul medical, unde fiecare informație poate fi vitală. Altele utilizează aproximările modelului liniar pentru a aplica concatenarea multi-intrare, agravând rezultatele deoarece toate informațiile sunt luate în considerare, chiar dacă sunt conflictuale sau zgomotoase în raport cu un fundal comun. În ciuda importanței și impactului social al medicinei, nu există soluții ad-hoc pentru rezumarea mai multor documente. Din acest motiv, propunem o nouă metodă probabilistică discriminativă marginalizată (DAMEN), instruită să discrimineze informațiile critice dintr-un grup de documente medicale legate de subiecte și să genereze un rezumat multi-document prin marginalizarea probabilității token. Rezultatele demonstrează că depăşim performanţele anterioare de ultimă generaţie pe un set de date biomedicale pentru rezumarea mai multor documente a revistelor sistematice ale literaturii. Mai mult decât atât, efectuăm studii ample de ablație pentru a motiva alegerile de proiectare și a dovedi importanța fiecărui modul al metodei noastre.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරස්තූතිය ස්ථානය- of- the- art Transfer- අධාරිත විස්තරයක් පරිස්සම් කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත් එක්ක- ලේඛණ NLP කාර්ය සඳහා විශාල විස්තරයක් සමහ ගොඩක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ කරනවා, ඉතින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධතාවක් අව වෙන කිසිම ලේනියර් මෝඩේල් සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් ඇතුළු සම්බන්ධතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න, ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප වෛද්\u200dයාවයේ වැදගත් සහ සාමාජික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නමුත්, විශාල විස්තරයක් විතරක් නෑ. මේ හේතුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නියම විශ්වාසික විධානය (DAMEN) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාසික තොරතුරු අතර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා අපි පිළිබඳ ස්ථානය-of-the-art ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනු තවත්, අපි විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා අපේ විධානයේ හැම මොඩියෝලෙක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සාක්ෂා කරන්න.', 'so': 'In kastoo ay xalallada ku qoran-farshaxanka-farshaxanka ayaa suurtagal ku noqday meelo kala duduwan oo lagu sameeyo shaqooyinka NLP oo kaliya, waxay weli u dagaalamayaan inay ka sheekeystaan shaqooyin badan oo ku qoran sida summarinta wargeyska badan oo kala duduwan. Many solutions truncate the inputs, thus ignoring potential summary-relevant contents, which is unacceptable in the medical domain where each information can be vital.  Qaar kalena waxaa laga yaabaa in lagu codsado sameynta midowga qoriga ah oo la xiriira midibo badan, sababtoo ah macluumaadka oo dhan waxaa laga fiiriyaa, xataa haddii ay ku jiro muran ama qaylo ku saabsan bakhtiga qayb ahaan. Inta kastoo ay muhiim u tahay iyo saameyn bulsho ah ee dawooyinka, dhameystirka qoraalka kala duduwan looma helo xalal caadi ah. Sababtaas darteed waxaan soo jeedaynaa qoraal oo kala takoorisan qaab suurtagal ah (DAMEN) oo loo baray in lagu takooro macluumaad muhiimsan ah oo laga soo diro warqad warqad caafimaad ah oo la xiriira islamarkaasna aan soo saarno summar oo warqad badan oo warqad ah oo ku qoran calaamad ah. Resultadu waxay caddeysaa inaannu ka samaysannay xaaladdii hore ee arimaha dawooyinka ee biomedical ee u qoran qoraalka warqadda nidaamka ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa waxbarasho aad u dheer si aan u dhaqaajinno doorashooyinka designka iyo inaannu u caddayno muhiimka noocyada oo dhan.', 'sv': 'Även om nuvarande state-of-the-art Transformer-baserade lösningar lyckades med ett brett spektrum av NLP-uppgifter med ett enda dokument, har de fortfarande svårt att hantera uppgifter med flera inmatningar som sammanfattning av flera dokument. Många lösningar förkortar inmatningarna och ignorerar därmed potentiellt sammanfattande relevant innehåll, vilket är oacceptabelt inom det medicinska området där varje information kan vara avgörande. Andra utnyttjar linjära modellapproximationer för att tillämpa fleringående sammankoppling, vilket försämrar resultaten eftersom all information beaktas, även om den är motstridig eller bullrig med avseende på en delad bakgrund. Trots medicinens betydelse och sociala påverkan finns det inga tillfälliga lösningar för sammanfattning av flera dokument. Därför föreslår vi en ny diskriminerande marginaliserad sannolikhetsmetod (DAMEN) utbildad för att särskilja kritisk information från ett kluster av ämnesrelaterade medicinska dokument och generera en sammanfattning av flera dokument via symbolisk sannolikhetsmarginalisering. Resultaten visar att vi överträffar tidigare state-of-the-art på ett biomedicinskt dataset för flerdokuments sammanfattning av systematiska litteraturöversikter. Dessutom utför vi omfattande ablationsstudier för att motivera designval och bevisa vikten av varje modul i vår metod.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய நிலை- கலை மாற்றும் மாற்றியமைப்பு தீர்வுகள் ஒரு வெளியே NLP பணிகளுக்கு வெற்றிகரமாக வெற்றிகரமாக இருந்தாலும், அவர்கள் பல ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்கம் போ பெரும்பால் தீர்வுகள் உள்ளீடுகளை பிரித்து விடுகின்றன, ஆகையால் சுருக்கம் தொடர்புடைய உள்ளடக்கங்களை தவிர்க்கவும், அது மருத்துவ களத் மற்றவைகள் வாழ்க்கை கோடு மாதிரி சுருக்கம் பல உள்ளீடு முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு, முடிவுகளை குறைக்கும், ஏனெனில் அனைத்து தகவலும் கருதப்படும், பின் மருத்துவின் முக்கியம் மற்றும் சமூக விளைவு எதுவும் இருந்தாலும் பல ஆவணங்கள் சுருக்கம் செய்தலுக்கு தனிப்பட்ட தீர்வ இந்த காரணத்திற்காக, நாம் ஒரு புதிய வேறுபடுத்தப்பட்ட சாத்தியமான முறைமையை (DAMEN) பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஒரு தலைப்பு தொடர்புடைய மருத்துவ ஆவணங்களிலிருந்து பிரச்சனைய முடிவு மேலும், நாங்கள் வடிவமைப்பு தேர்வுகளை ஆராய்ந்து ஒவ்வொரு முறையின் முக்கியத்தை தெரிவிக்க வேண்டும்.', 'sr': 'Iako su trenutne rešenje koje su bazirane na transformatoru umetnosti uspjele u širokom rasponu za jedinstveno dokumentovane zadatke NLP, oni se i dalje bore za rješavanje multi-input zadataka poput sažetke multi-dokumenta. Mnogo rešenja smanjuje ulaganje, tako ignorišući potencijalni sadržaj za sažetak, koji je neprihvatljiv u medicinskoj domenu gdje svaka informacija može biti vitalna. Drugi primjenjuju linearne približavanje model a za primjenu multi-input, pogoršavaju rezultate zato što se smatra svim informacijama, čak i ako je konflikt ili buka u vezi sa zajedničkim pozadinom. Uprkos važnom i socijalnom uticaju lijeka, ne postoje ad-hoc rešenja za sažetak višestrukih dokumenta. Zbog ovog razloga predlažemo novu diskriminiranu marginaliziranu verovatnoću metodu (DAMEN) obučenu da diskriminira kritične informacije iz grupe medicinskih dokumenta povezanih sa temom i stvori sažetak multidokumenta putem marginalizacije verovatnoće znakova. Rezultati dokazuju da smo izvršili prethodno stanje umjetnosti na biomedicinskom setu podataka za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta sistemskih pregleda literature. Osim toga, obavljamo široke studije ablacije kako bi motivirali izbore dizajna i dokazali važnost svakog modula našeg metoda.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ موجود state-of-the-art Transformer-based solutions in a wide range for single-document NLP tasks, they still struggle to address multi-input tasks such as multi-document summarization. بہت سی حل اپنا اینپوٹ ٹوٹ کر دیتے ہیں، یہاں تک کہ امکانات کے ذریعہ منتخب موجود موجود موجود ہیں، جسے ہر معلومات ضروری ہو سکتی ہے، پزشکی دامین میں قبول نہیں کرسکتی۔ اور دوسرے لوگ بہت سے اینٹ پیٹ پیٹ پیٹ کے لئے لائق کریں، نتائج کو بدتر کریں کیونکہ تمام معلومات کو سمجھ لیا جاتا ہے، اگرچہ یہ ایک مشترک پیٹ پیٹ پیٹ کے بارے میں مخالفت یا آواز کے ساتھ مخالفت کرتا ہے۔ داروغ کے اہم اور اجتماعی اثرات کے بغیر، بہت سی دفتروں کی تعریف کے لئے ad-hoc حل نہیں ہیں. اس وجہ سے، ہم ایک نو جدا جدا جدا جدا کرنا چاہتے ہیں، امکانات طریقہ (DAMEN) کی تعلیم کی جاتی ہے جو ایک ٹوپ کے متعلق مربوط پزشکی دکھانے والی دکھانے والی دکھانے کے کلسٹر سے ضروری معلومات جدا کرنا اور ٹوکنے کی امکانات مارجینال کے ذریعہ ایک بہت سے دکھ نتیجے ثابت کر رہے ہیں کہ ہم پہلے کی حالت آرتی کو ایک بیولوڈیسیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ پر زیادہ دکھانے کے لئے سیسٹم ادبیات روشنی کے ذریعے مزید دکھانے کے لئے انجام دیتے ہیں. اور ہم طراحی انتخاب کے ذریعے بڑی غیر قابل تحقیقات کریں اور ہمارے طریقے کے ہر موڈل کا اہم ثابت کریں۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Koʻp xabarlar natijalarni qo'yish mumkin. Шундай қилиб, maktab muhim tarkibini saqlash mumkin. Bu davlatda, har bir maʼlumot muhim bo'lgan holatda qabul qilmaydi. Name Davlatning muhimi va ijtimoiy muammolari bo'lsa, ko'pgina hujjatni ajratish uchun boshqa usullar yo'q. Bu sababda, biz oddiy aniqlik qilingan novel (DAMEN) usulini o'rganish uchun muhim mavjud hujjatlarni ajratish uchun o'rganamiz va muvaffaqiyatli mavjud hujjatlardan bir necha hujjatni yaratish mumkin. @ info Moreover, we perform extensive ablation studies to motivate the design choices and prove the importance of each module of our method.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù các giải pháp biến hình đang hiện đại Đã có rất nhiều cách để thực hiện các công việc lập trình độc tài, chúng vẫn cố gắng giải quyết các công việc đa nhập, như mô phỏng các tài liệu. Rất nhiều giải pháp cắt nguồn nội dung, bằng cách bỏ qua các nội dung có liên quan đến tổng quát, không thể chấp nhận trong lĩnh vực y tế nơi mỗi thông tin có thể trở nên quan trọng. Các phương pháp khác sử dụng mô hình tuyến khác nhau để áp dụng kết nối nhiều nhà nhập, làm giảm kết quả vì tất cả thông tin được xem xét, mặc dù nó có mâu thuẫn hoặc ồn ào với một nền chung. Mặc cho tầm quan trọng và tác động xã hội của y học, không có giải pháp cụ thể cho việc tổng hợp tài liệu. Do đó, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp di căn căn cứ ngoại tình mới được đào tạo để phân biệt thông tin quan trọng từ một nhóm các tài liệu y khoa liên quan đến chủ đề và tạo ra một bản tóm tắt đa tài liệu bằng biểu thị ngoại giao xác suất. Các kết quả chứng minh chúng ta vượt quá siêu tiến độ trước đây trên một tập tin sinh học cho việc tổng quát bài văn học có hệ thống. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đang nghiên cứu cẩn thận để kích thích các lựa chọn thiết kế và chứng minh tầm quan trọng của mỗi mô-đun của phương pháp.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че съвременните решения, базирани на трансформатори, успяват в широк спектър от задачи за НЛО с един документ, те все още се борят да се справят с задачи с няколко входа, като обобщаване на няколко документа. Много решения съкращават входящите данни, като по този начин пренебрегват потенциалното съдържание, което е неприемливо в областта на медицината, където всяка информация може да бъде жизненоважна. Други използват линейните приблизителни модели, за да приложат многовходна конкатенация, влошавайки резултатите, защото цялата информация се разглежда, дори ако е противоречива или шумна по отношение на споделен фон. Въпреки важността и социалното въздействие на медицината, няма ad hoc решения за обобщаване на множество документи. Поради тази причина предлагаме нов дискриминативен маргинализиран вероятностен метод (ДАМЕН), обучен да дискриминира критична информация от клъстер от свързани с темата медицински документи и да генерира мултидокументално резюме чрез маргинализация на вероятността от символ. Резултатите доказват, че сме по-добри от предишните най-съвременни в биомедицинския набор от данни за многодокументално обобщаване на систематични прегледи на литературата. Освен това извършваме обширни проучвания за аблация, за да мотивираме избора на дизайн и да докажем важността на всеки модул от нашия метод.', 'hr': 'Iako su trenutne rješenje na temelju transformera uspjele u širokom rasponu za zadatke NLP-a u jednom dokumentu, još uvijek se bore za rješavanje višeulosnih zadataka poput sažetke višestrukog dokumenta. Mnoge rješenja smanjuju ulaganje, tako ignorirajući potencijalni sadržaj za sažetak relevantnih, koji je neprihvatljiv u medicinskom domenu gdje svaka informacija može biti vitalna. Drugi primjenjuju linearne približavanje model a za primjenu multi-input samopouzdanja, pogoršavajući rezultate jer se smatra svim informacijama, čak i ako se sukoba ili buka u vezi s zajedničkim pozadinom. Unatoč važnosti i socijalnog učinka lijeka, ne postoje ad-hoc rješenja za sažetak višestrukih dokumenta. Zbog ovog razloga predlažemo novu diskriminiranu marginaliziranu verovatnoću metodu (DAMEN) obučenu kako bi diskriminirali kritične informacije iz skupine medicinskih dokumenta povezanih s temom i stvorili sažetak višestrukog dokumenta putem marginalizacije vjerojatnosti znakova. Rezultati dokazuju da smo izvršili prethodno stanje umjetnosti na biomedicinskom setu podataka za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta sistematičnih pregleda književnosti. Osim toga, obavljamo široke studije ablacije kako bi motivirali izbore dizajna i dokazali važnost svakog modula našeg metoda.', 'da': 'Selvom de nuværende state-of-the-art Transformer-baserede løsninger lykkedes i en lang række til enkeltdokumenters NLP-opgaver, har de stadig svært ved at løse opgaver med flere input, såsom opsummering af flere dokumenter. Mange løsninger afkorter input og ignorerer dermed potentielt resumérelevant indhold, hvilket er uacceptabelt på det medicinske område, hvor hver information kan være afgørende. Andre benytter lineære modelltilnærmelser til at anvende multi-input sammenhæng, hvilket forværrer resultaterne, fordi alle oplysninger tages i betragtning, selv om de er modstridende eller støjende i forhold til en fælles baggrund. På trods af medicinens betydning og sociale virkning findes der ingen ad hoc-løsninger til opsummering af flere dokumenter. Derfor foreslår vi en ny diskriminerende marginaliseret probabilistisk metode (DAMEN), der er uddannet til at skelne kritisk information fra en klynge af emnerelaterede medicinske dokumenter og generere en multi-dokument resumé via token sandsynlighed marginalisering. Resultaterne viser, at vi overgår den tidligere state-of-the-art på et biomedicinsk datasæt til multi-dokumentopsummering af systematiske litteraturgennemgang. Desuden udfører vi omfattende ablationsstudier for at motivere designvalgene og bevise vigtigheden af hvert modul i vores metode.', 'nl': 'Hoewel de huidige state-of-the-art Transformer-oplossingen een breed scala aan NLP-taken met één document hebben bereikt, hebben ze nog steeds moeite om taken met meerdere invoer, zoals samenvatting van meerdere documenten, aan te pakken. Veel oplossingen snijden de inputs af, waardoor potentiële samenvattingsrelevante inhoud wordt genegeerd, wat onaanvaardbaar is in het medische domein waar elke informatie van vitaal belang kan zijn. Anderen maken gebruik van lineaire modelproximaties om multi-input aaneenschakeling toe te passen, waardoor de resultaten verslechteren omdat alle informatie in aanmerking wordt genomen, zelfs als deze conflicterend of luidruchtig is met betrekking tot een gedeelde achtergrond. Ondanks het belang en de sociale impact van geneeskunde zijn er geen ad-hoc oplossingen voor multi-document samenvatting. Om deze reden stellen we een nieuwe discriminatieve marginalized probabilistic method (DAMEN) voor, getraind om kritische informatie te onderscheiden uit een cluster van onderwerpen gerelateerde medische documenten en een multi-document samenvatting te genereren via token waarschijnlijkheid marginalisatie. De resultaten bewijzen dat we beter presteren dan de vorige state-of-the-art op een biomedische dataset voor multi-document samenvatting van systematische literatuurbeoordelingen. Bovendien voeren we uitgebreide ablatiestudies uit om de ontwerpkeuzes te motiveren en het belang van elke module van onze methode te bewijzen.', 'de': 'Obwohl die aktuellen Transformer-basierten Lösungen ein breites Spektrum für NLP-Aufgaben mit einem Dokument erreicht haben, haben sie immer noch Schwierigkeiten, Multi-Input-Aufgaben wie die Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente zu bewältigen. Viele Lösungen kürzen die Eingaben und ignorieren damit mögliche zusammenfassungsrelevante Inhalte, was im medizinischen Bereich, wo jede Information lebenswichtig sein kann, inakzeptabel ist. Andere nutzen lineare Modellannäherungen, um Multi-Input-Verkettung anzuwenden, was die Ergebnisse verschlechtert, da alle Informationen berücksichtigt werden, auch wenn sie in Bezug auf einen gemeinsamen Hintergrund widersprüchlich oder verrauscht sind. Trotz der Bedeutung und sozialen Auswirkungen der Medizin gibt es keine Ad-hoc-Lösungen für die Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente. Aus diesem Grund schlagen wir eine neuartige diskriminierende marginalisierte probabilistische Methode (DAMEN) vor, die darauf trainiert ist, kritische Informationen aus einem Cluster von themenbezogenen medizinischen Dokumenten zu unterscheiden und eine Multi-Dokument-Zusammenfassung über Token-Wahrscheinlichkeitsmarginalisierung zu generieren. Die Ergebnisse belegen, dass wir den bisherigen Stand der Technik auf einem biomedizinischen Datensatz zur mehrdokumentigen Zusammenfassung systematischer Literaturrecherchen übertreffen. Darüber hinaus führen wir umfangreiche Ablationsstudien durch, um die Designentscheidungen zu motivieren und die Bedeutung jedes Moduls unserer Methode zu belegen.', 'id': 'Meskipun solusi terbaik saat ini berasaskan Transformer berhasil dalam jangkauan luas untuk tugas NLP dokumen tunggal, mereka masih berjuang untuk mengatasi tugas multi-input seperti penghasilan multi-dokumen. Banyak solusi memotong masukan, sehingga mengabaikan potensi isi ringkasan-relevan, yang tidak dapat diterima di daerah medis di mana setiap informasi dapat menjadi penting. Lain-lain menggunakan pendekatan model linear untuk menerapkan kontatenasi multi-input, memperburuk hasilnya karena semua informasi dianggap, bahkan jika konflik atau suara terhadap latar belakang yang sama. Meskipun penting dan dampak sosial dari perubatan, tidak ada solusi ad hoc untuk penghasilan multi-dokumen. Untuk alasan ini, kami mengusulkan metode probabilis marginalisasi diskriminatif (DAMEN) yang baru dilatih untuk diskriminasi informasi kritis dari kumpulan dokumen medis terkait topik dan menghasilkan ringkasan multi-dokumen melalui marginalisasi probabilitas token. Hasil membuktikan kita melampaui batas kemajuan sebelumnya pada set data biomedis untuk multi-dokumen ringkasan penelitian sastra sistematis. Moreover, we perform extensive ablation studies to motivate the design choices and prove the importance of each module of our method.', 'fa': 'اگرچه راه\u200cحل\u200cهایی که بر اساس تبدیل\u200cکننده\u200cی هنری موفق می\u200cشوند در محدوده\u200cای گسترده برای کارهای NLP یک سند، هنوز می\u200cکوشند تا کار\u200cهای چندین ورودی مانند جمع\u200cآوری سند\u200cهای زیادی را حل کند. بسیاری از راه\u200cحل\u200cها وارد شدن را تغییر می\u200cدهند، بنابراین از محتویات محتویات محتویات مربوط به جمع\u200cآوری که در دامنۀ پزشکی قابل قبول نیست، که هر اطلاعات می\u200cتواند حیاتی باشد. بقیه نزدیکت\u200cهای مدل خطی را برای استفاده از هماهنگی چندین ورودی تأثیر می\u200cدهند، و نتیجه\u200cها را بدتر می\u200cکند، زیرا همه اطلاعات به نظر می\u200cرسد، حتی اگر در مورد یک پشتیبانی مشترک مخالفت یا صدا باشد. با وجود اثر مهم و اجتماعی پزشکی، هیچ راه حلی ad-hoc برای جمع کردن مجموعه سند وجود ندارد. به خاطر این دلیل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش احتمالات متفاوتی جدایی (DAMEN) که آموزش می\u200cدهد تا اطلاعات جدایی از یک گروه مدارک پزشکی رابطه به عنوان موضوع جدایی کند و با وسیله ترکیب احتمالات توکین یک جمع بسیاری از سند\u200cها را تولید کنیم. نتیجه\u200cها ثابت می\u200cکنند که ما موقعیت پیشین هنر را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای بیولوپزشکی برای جمع کردن مجموعه\u200cهای سند\u200cهای سیستم تحقیقات ادبیات انجام می\u200cدهیم. به علاوه، ما مطالعه\u200cهای فعالیت زیادی را انجام می\u200cدهیم تا انتخاب\u200cهای طراحی را تحریک کنیم و اهمیت هر مدول روش ما را ثابت کنیم.', 'sw': 'Ingawa ufumbuzi wa hali ya sasa wa sanaa wa zamani ulifanikiwa katika kiwango kikubwa cha kazi za NLP pekee, bado wanajitahidi kuelekeza kazi nyingi za kujiandikisha kama vile muhtasari wa nyaraka nyingi. Many solutions truncate the inputs, thus ignoring potential summary-relevant contents, which is unacceptable in the medical domain where each information can be vital.  Wengine wanakabiliwa na mifano ya msingi ya utumiaji ili kutengeneza ushirikiano wa habari nyingi, yanabadilisha matokeo kwa sababu taarifa zote zinachukuliwa, hata kama ni mgogoro au kelele kwa kuhusiana na baki ya ushirikiano. Pamoja na umuhimu na madhara ya kijamii ya dawa, hakuna suluhisho la utambulisho wa nyaraka nyingi. Kwa sababu hii, tunapendekeza njia ya kisasa yenye ubaguzi wa uwezekano (DAMEN) inayofundishwa kutofautisha taarifa muhimu kutoka kwenye mfululizo wa nyaraka za kitabibu zinazohusiana na mada na kutengeneza muhtasari wa nyaraka mbalimbali kupitia uwezekano wa kuharibiwa. Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba tunaendesha hali ya sanaa iliyopita katika seti ya taarifa za kitabibu kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa warithi wa mfumo. Zaidi ya hayo, tunafanya tafiti nyingi za kuboresha ili kuhamasisha uchaguzi wa ubunifu na kuthibitisha umuhimu wa kila njia yetu.', 'ko': '비록 현재 가장 선진적인 Transformer 기반 해결 방안이 단일 문서 NLP 작업에서 광범위한 성공을 거두었지만, 그것들은 여전히 다중 입력 작업, 예를 들어 다중 문서 요약을 해결하기 어렵다.많은 해결 방안들이 입력을 차단하고 잠재적인 요약과 관련된 내용을 무시하는데, 이것은 의학 분야에서 받아들일 수 없는 것이다. 왜냐하면 모든 정보가 매우 중요하기 때문이다.다른 사람들은 선형 모델의 근사성을 이용하여 다수입 직렬을 응용한다. 모든 정보를 고려했기 때문에 그 결과는 공유 배경과 충돌하거나 소음이 있어도 악화된다.의학은 중요한 의미와 사회적 영향을 미치지만 다중 문서 요약에 대해서는 별다른 해결 방안이 없다.이를 바탕으로 우리는 새로운 판별 변두리화 확률 방법(DAMEN)을 제시했다. 이 방법은 주제와 관련된 의학 문서에서 관건적인 정보를 식별하고 표기 확률 변두리화를 통해 다중 문서 요약을 생성할 수 있다.그 결과 시스템 문헌을 종합한 다중 문서 종합에 있어 우리는 생물의학 데이터 집합에서 이전의 최신 수준보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.그 밖에 우리는 광범위한 소식 연구를 진행하여 디자인 선택을 자극하고 우리의 방법 중의 각 모듈의 중요성을 증명했다.', 'tr': 'H채zirki m철h체m m철h체m-surat terjime edip g철rkezilen 챌철z체mler NLP t채blikleri 체챌in be첵leki g철rn체힊de bo힊adylar. Olar heniz multi-sened terjime 첵aly multi-giri힊 t채bliklerinden 챌ykar첵arlar. K철p 챌철z체m giri힊ini azalt첵ar, 힊onu흫 체챌in olary흫 철n체ne g철rn체힊i mahsusyny bilme첵채r. Bu lukmany흫 i챌inde her maglumat m철h체m bolup biljek 첵erde kabul edilmez. Ba힊galar multi-girdi gabdalyklary 체첵tgetmek 체챌in 챌izgini흫 nusgasyny 챌ykar, netijeleri erbetle힊dir첵채r seb채bi hemme maglumat d체힊체n체len bolsa-da, hatda bu nusgasy 첵a-da g체rr체흫 pa첵la힊yl첵an arkada. Dermany흫 wajyplygyna we sosial t채sirine ra휓men, birn채챌e-sened jemgy첵etlere ad-hoc 챌철z체mler 첵ok. 힇ol seb채pli biz diskrimin챌채k gabdalyk t채ze bir t채ze (DAMEN) m체mkin m철h체m hilli maglumaty diskrimin챌채 ta첵첵arlanan t채ze bir t채ze teklip ber첵채ris we token m철h체m d철wletlere g철r채 bir multi-sened toparyny bejer첵채ris. Netijenler sistematik edebi첵aty흫 barlamasynda 철흫ki sanat me첵dan챌asyny흫 체st체nde bir biomedical veri setirini 챌ykar첵andygyny kan캇tla첵ar. Munu흫 첵agda첵ynda, biz d체zenleme sa첵lawlaryny n채hili m철h체mdigini kan캇tlamak 체챌in gola첵 etm채ge 챌al캇힊첵arys.', 'af': "Alhoewel huidige staat- of- the- art Transformer- gebaseerde oplossings suksesvol in 'n wyde omvang vir enkel- dokument NLP taak, hulle struikel nog steeds na adres van multi- invoer taak soos multi- dokument opsomming. Baie oplossing verklein die inputs, sodat die potensiele opsomming-relevante inhoud ignoreer, wat nie aanvaarbaar is in die mediese domein waar elke inligting vitaal kan wees nie. Ander aanvaar lineêre model toekoms om multi-invoer samekoms te aanwend, verder die resultate omdat alle inligting aangesien word, selfs as dit konflikteer of geluid is met respek na 'n gedeelde agtergrond. Onthou die belangrikheid en sosiale effek van medikasie is daar geen ad-hoc oplossing vir multi-dokument opsomming nie. Hierdie rede stel ons 'n nuwe diskriminasiewe marginaliseerde waarskynlike metode (DAMEN) opgelei om kritiese inligting te diskriminasie van 'n klaster van onderwerp verwante medicinske dokumente en 'n multi-dokument opsomming te genereer deur token waarskynlik marginalisasie. Resultate bevestig dat ons die vorige state-of-the-art uitvoer op 'n biomediese datastel vir multi-dokument opsomming van systematiese literateur resensies. Ook, ons doen uitbreidige ablasie studies om die ontwerp keuses te motiveer en die belangrikheid van elke module van ons metode te bevestig.", 'sq': 'Although current state-of-the-art Transformer-based solutions succeeded in a wide range for single-document NLP tasks, they still struggle to address multi-input tasks such as multi-document summarization.  Shumë zgjidhje i shkurtojnë hyrjet, duke injoruar kështu përmbajtjen potenciale të rëndësishme për përmbledhjet, e cila është e papranueshme në fushën mjekësore ku secila informacion mund të jetë jetike. Të tjerë nxisin përafërsisë lineare të model it për të aplikuar ndërprerjen me shumë hyrje, duke përkeqësuar rezultatet sepse të gjitha informacionet konsiderohen, edhe nëse janë në konflikt apo zhurmë lidhur me një sfond të përbashkët. Megjithë rëndësinë dhe ndikimin social të mjekësisë, nuk ka zgjidhje ad-hoc për përmbledhjen e shumë dokumenteve. Për këtë arsye, ne propozojmë një metodë të re diskriminuese të marginalizuar probabiliste (DAMEN) të trajnuar për të diskriminuar informacionin kritik nga një grup dokumentesh mjekësorë lidhur me temën dhe për të gjeneruar një përmbledhje shumë-dokumentesh nëpërmjet marginalizimit të probabilitetit token. Rezultatet dëshmojnë se ne e kalojmë gjendjen më të mëparshme të teknologjisë në një grup të dhënash biomedikale për përmbledhjen shumëdokumentore të shqyrtimeve sistematike të letërsisë. Përveç kësaj, ne kryejmë studime të gjerë ablacioni për të motivuar zgjedhjet e dizajnit dhe për të provuar rëndësinë e çdo moduli të metodës sonë.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን የአሁኑ ሁኔታ-የፊደል-Art-Based-Transformer-based solutions በሰፊ ሰነድ NLP ስራዎችን በመስጠት ስኬቶች ውስጥ ተቃውሞአል፤ እንደ ብዙ-ሰነድ አቀማመጥ እንደተደረገ ብዙዎችን የinput ስራዎችን ለመቀበል ይጋደላሉ፡፡ ብዙ ማስታወቂያዎች የጠቃሚ ማኅበረሰብ የሚሆኑትን ጥቃቄ ይጎድላሉ፡፡ ሌሎች የደረጃ መስመር መስመር በብዙ-የድምፅ ምርጫዎችን ለመቀበል የሚያስቀናቅል፣ ፍሬዎቹን የሚያሳፍር፣ ምክንያቱም ሁሉም መረጃዎች በተለያዩ መሬት ላይ ቢሆን ወይም ድምፅ ቢሆን እንኳ ይታሰናበታል፡፡ የሕመምጽ ውጤትና ማኅበራዊ ጉዳይ ምንም እንኳን፣ በብዙ ሰነድ አካባቢ ማስታወቂያ ምንም አካባቢ የለውም፡፡ ስለዚህም ምክንያት፣ በተለየ ማስታወቂያዊ ተሟጋቾች (DAMEN) የረኀብ መረጃዎችን ለመለየት እና በተቃውሞው ማህበረሰብ በጥቅልቅ እና በቶሎ ማቅረብ የተደረገውን የብዙ የሰነድ ቁጥጥር ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ የቀድሞውን የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-አካል ድረ-አካል ላይ በብዙ-ሰነድ የስርዓት ሐሳባዊ ድምፅ ማሳሳየትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ደግሞም የልጅን ምርጫዎችን ለመንቀሳቀስ እና የዓይነታችንን ሞዴል ሁሉ ማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Şimdiki NLP işləri üçün tək-dövlətli NLP işləri üçün müəyyən bir səviyyədə istifadə etmək üçün çox-giriş işləri ilə mübahisə edirlər. Birçox çətinliklər inputləri dəyişdirir, belə ki, hər bir məlumat həqiqi olaraq mümkün olaraq təhsil edilməyən təhsil dəyişdirilməsi mümkün deyildir. Başqaları çoxlu girdi birləşdirməsi üçün linear modellərin yaxınlıqlarını təmin edir, sonuçları dəyişdirir, çünki bütün məlumatlar paylaşdığı arxa plan barəsində mübahisə və səslənirsə də düşünürlər. Təbbəzin möhümlülülüyü və sosyal təsiri istisna olmasına rağmen, çoxlu dökümət təmizlənməsi üçün ad-hoc çətinliklər yoxdur. Bu səbəbdən, biz yeni diskriminasiyyətli marginalisik metodu (DAMEN) təhsil etdik ki, mövzu ilə bağlı tıbbi belgeler arasında kritik məlumatları ayırmaq üçün təhsil edilmiş və token olaraq çoxlu belgeler təhsil edir. Sonuçlar sistematik ədəbiyyat tərzlərinin çoxlu beləliklə təmizlənməsi üçün əvvəlki məlumatların məlumatlarını göstərir. Daha sonra, biz dizayn seçimlərini motivatlı etmək üçün geniş ablasiya təhsil edirik və metodumunun hər modulu mövzusını təsdiqləyirik.', 'bs': 'Iako su trenutne rješenje koje su temeljene na transformaciji umjetnosti uspjele u širokom rasponu za zadatke NLP jednodokumenta, oni se i dalje bore za rješavanje multi-ulaznih zadataka poput sažetke multi-dokumenta. Mnogo rješenja smanjuje ulaganje, tako ignorišući potencijalni sadržaj vezanih za sažetak, koji je neprihvatljiv u medicinskom domenu gdje svaka informacija može biti vitalna. Drugi primjenjuju linearne približavanje model a za primjenu multi-input samopouzdanja, pogoršavajući rezultate jer se smatra svim informacijama, čak i ako se sukoba ili buka u vezi s zajedničkim pozadinom. Unatoč važnosti i socijalnog utjecaja lijeka, ne postoje ad-hoc rješenja za sažetak višestrukih dokumenta. Zbog ovog razloga predlažemo novu diskriminiranu marginaliziranu verovatnoću metodu (DAMEN) obučenu za diskriminiranje kritičnih informacija iz grupe medicinskih dokumenta povezanih s temom i proizvedemo sažetak multidokumenta putem marginalizacije mogućnosti znakova. Rezultati dokazuju da smo izvršili prethodno stanje umjetnosti na biomedicinskom setu podataka za sažetak višestrukih dokumenta sistemskih pregleda literature. Osim toga, obavljamo široke studije ablacije kako bi motivirali izbore dizajna i dokazali važnost svakog modula našeg metoda.', 'hy': 'Չնայած, որ ներկայիս ամենահետաքրքիր տրանսֆերմերների հիմնված լուծումները հաջողվեցին մեկ փաստաթղթի ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների լայն տարածքում, նրանք դեռևս պայքարում են բազմազան ներմուծման առաջադրանքների լուծման համար, ինչպիսիք են բազ Many solutions truncate the inputs, thus ignoring potential summary-relevant contents, which is unacceptable in the medical domain where each information can be vital.  Մյուսները օգտագործում են գծային մոդելների մոտեցումները, որպեսզի կիրառվի բազմազան ներմուծման կոնկրետացիան, վատթանում են արդյունքները, որովհետև բոլոր տեղեկատվությունը համարվում է, նույնիսկ եթե այն հակամարտություն է կամ աղմկոտ ընդհանուր ետ Չնայած բժշկության կարևորության և սոցիալական ազդեցության, բազմափաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման համար ոչ մի հատուկ լուծում չկա: Այս պատճառով մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խտրականորեն բաժանված հավանականության մեթոդ (DAMeN), որը պատրաստված է խտրականորեն խտրականորել թեմային կապված բժշկական փաստաթղթերի մի խմբից և ստեղծել բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրություն նշանակալի հավանականության բաժանման միջո Արդյունքները ապացուցում են, որ մենք գերազանցում ենք նախորդ բարձր արդյունքները կենսաբժշկական տվյալների համակարգի համար, որպեսզի բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթեր համառոտագրենք սիստեմատիկ գրականության վերլուծությունները: Ավելին, մենք կատարում ենք էքսպանցիոնալ աբլացիոն ուսումնասիրություններ, որպեսզի խթանենք դիզայնի ընտրությունները և ապացուցենք մեր մեթոդի յուրաքանչյուր մոդուլների կարևորությունը:', 'bn': 'যদিও বর্তমান পরিস্থিতি-শিল্পের ট্রান্সফার্ম ভিত্তিক সমাধান সফল হয়েছে একক নথিপত্র এনএলপি কাজের জন্য, তবুও তারা অনেক নথিপত্রের সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের অনেক সমাধান ইনপুটের প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রতিষ্ঠানের কারণে সম্ভাব্য সংক্ষেপ-সম্পর্কিত বিষয়বস্তুকে উপেক্ষা করা যায়, যা মেডিকেল ডোমেইন অন্যান্য অন্যান্য লেভারেজ লাইনের মডেলের ক্ষেত্রে বহুল ইনপুট কন্টারেশন প্রয়োগ করতে পারে, ফলাফল ব্যর্থ হয়ে যায়, কারণ সকল তথ্য বিবেচনা করা হচ্ছে, এম ওষুধের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং সামাজিক প্রভাব সত্ত্বেও, বহুল নথিপত্রের সংক্ষেপের জন্য কোন বিজেদ সমাধান নেই। এই কারণের জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করছি সম্ভাব্য বৈষম্যিক পদ্ধতি (ডিএমেন) সম্ভাব্য বৈচিত্র্যের প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে বিষয়বস্তু সম্পর্কিত চিকিৎসার তথ্য বৈচিত্র্যুত করার ফলাফল প্রমাণ করে যে আমরা পূর্ববর্তী শিল্পের অবস্থা বায়োমেডিকেল ডাটাসেটের সারসংক্ষেপের জন্য বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর সাহিত্যে সংক্ষেপ Moreover, we perform extensive ablation studies to motivate the design choices and prove the importance of each module of our method.', 'ca': "Tot i que les solucions actuals basades en Transformers van tenir èxit en una amplia gama de tasques de NLP d'un únic document, encara lluiten per abordar tasques de múltiples entrades, com la resumida de múltiples documents. Moltes solucions redueixen les entrades, ignorant el contingut potencial de resum pertinent, que és inacceptable en el domini mèdic on cada informació pot ser vital. Others leverage linear model approximations to apply multi-input concatenation, worsening the results because all information is considered, even if it is conflicting or noisy with respect to a shared background.  Despite the importance and social impact of medicine, there are no ad-hoc solutions for multi-document summarization.  Per aquesta raó, proposem un nou mètode marginat de probabilitat discriminatiu (DAMEN) entrenat per discriminar la informació crítica d'un grup de documents mèdics relacionats amb el tema i generar un resum multidocumental a través de la marginació de la probabilitat de fitxes. Els resultats demostren que superem l'actualitat anterior d'un conjunt de dades biomèdics per a resumir múltiples documents les revisions sistemàtiques de la literatura. A més, fem extensos estudis d'ablació per motivar les eleccions de disseny i demostrar l'importància de cada módul del nostre mètode.", 'cs': 'Přestože současná nejmodernější řešení založená na transformátoru uspěla v široké škále pro úlohy NLP s jedním dokumentem, stále se jim snaží řešit úlohy s více vstupy, jako je shrnutí více dokumentů. Mnoho řešení zkrátí vstupy, čímž ignoruje potenciální souhrnný obsah, což je nepřijatelné v lékařské oblasti, kde může být každá informace důležitá. Jiné využívají aproximace lineárních modelů k aplikaci řetězců s více vstupy, což zhoršuje výsledky, protože jsou zohledněny veškeré informace, i když jsou konfliktní nebo hlučné s ohledem na sdílené pozadí. Navzdory významu a sociálnímu dopadu medicíny neexistují žádná ad hoc řešení pro shrnutí více dokumentů. Z tohoto důvodu navrhujeme novou diskriminační marginalizovanou pravděpodobnostní metodu (DAMEN), vycvičenou k rozlišování kritických informací ze shluku tématických lékařských dokumentů a generování multidokumentového shrnutí pomocí marginalizace tokenové pravděpodobnosti. Výsledky dokazují, že překonáváme předchozí state-of-the-art na biomedicínském datovém souboru pro vícedokumentové shrnutí systematických recenzí literatury. Kromě toho provádíme rozsáhlé ablační studie, abychom motivovali návrhové volby a prokázali důležitost každého modulu naší metody.', 'fi': 'Vaikka nykyaikaiset Transformer-pohjaiset ratkaisut onnistuivat monenlaisissa yhden dokumentin NLP-tehtävissä, niillä on silti vaikeuksia käsitellä monisyöttötehtäviä, kuten monidokumenttien yhteenvetoa. Monet ratkaisut lyhentävät syötteitä ja jättävät huomiotta mahdollisen yhteenvedon sisällön, jota ei voida hyväksyä lääketieteen alalla, jossa jokainen tieto voi olla elintärkeää. Toiset hyödyntävät lineaarisia malliapproksimaatioita useiden syöttöjen yhdistämiseksi, mikä huonontaa tuloksia, koska kaikki tiedot otetaan huomioon, vaikka ne olisivat ristiriitaisia tai meluisia suhteessa yhteiseen taustaan. Lääketieteen merkityksestä ja yhteiskunnallisesta vaikutuksesta huolimatta ei ole olemassa tapauskohtaisia ratkaisuja useiden asiakirjojen yhteenvetoon. Tästä syystä ehdotamme uutta syrjivää marginalisoitua todennäköisyysmenetelmää (DAMEN), joka on koulutettu erottamaan kriittistä tietoa aihekohtaisista lääketieteellisistä asiakirjoista ja luomaan monidokumenttien yhteenvedon token todennäköisyysmarginaalin avulla. Tulokset osoittavat, että suoriudumme edellisistä uusimmista biolääketieteen aineistoista systemaattisten kirjallisuuskatsausten monidokumenttien yhteenvedossa. Lisäksi teemme laajoja ablaatiotutkimuksia motivoidaksemme suunnitteluvalintoja ja todistaaksemme menetelmämme jokaisen moduulin merkityksen.', 'et': 'Kuigi praegused tipptasemel transformaatoritel põhinevad lahendused õnnestuvad laias valikus ühe dokumendiga uue tööprogrammi ülesannete jaoks, on neil siiski raskusi lahendada mitme sisendiga ülesandeid, näiteks mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtlikkust. Paljud lahendused lühendavad sisendeid, ignoreerides seega võimalikku kokkuvõtlikku sisu, mis on vastuvõetamatu meditsiinivaldkonnas, kus iga teave võib olla eluliselt tähtis. Teised kasutavad lineaarsete mudelite lähenemisviise mitme sisendi ühendamise rakendamiseks, halvendades tulemusi, sest arvesse võetakse kogu teavet, isegi kui see on ühise tausta suhtes vastuoluline või mürakas. Vaatamata meditsiini tähtsusele ja sotsiaalsele mõjule ei ole mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtlikuks koostamiseks eraldi lahendusi. Sel põhjusel pakume välja uue diskrimineeriva marginaliseeritud tõenäosusliku meetodi (DAMEN), mis on koolitatud diskrimineerima kriitilist informatsiooni teemaga seotud meditsiiniliste dokumentide kogumist ja genereerima mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtte märgi tõenäosuse marginaliseerimise kaudu. Tulemused tõestavad, et tulemused on varasemast tehnika tasemest paremad biomeditsiiniliste andmekogumite puhul süstemaatiliste kirjandusülevaadete mitmekordseks kokkuvõtteks. Lisaks teostame ulatuslikke ablatsiooniuuringuid, et motiveerida projekteerimisvalikuid ja tõestada meie meetodi iga mooduli tähtsust.', 'ha': "Kuma kõ da yaushe na-state-of-the-art Transformer-Based soluɗe masu cin nasara a cikin tsawo wa aikin NLP masu haɗuwa da takardar guda, sai suna ƙari domin su yi amfani da aikin masu yawa kamar ƙararinsa na dokuman-multi. Da masu yawa masu shiryarwa sunã ƙara cikin cikin shirin ayuka, don haka ka ƙori masu yiwuwa masu muhimmi da muhimmi, wanda bã ya yarda a kare shi a cikin wuyan dawada inda duk agaji za'a iya amfani da shi. Wasu da wasu masu motsi na linje na tsayi don ya amfani da kunnufi masu yawa na cikin tsarin aiki, sunã ƙarar da matsala, kwanan an an yi amfani da dukan maɓallin aiki, kuma kõ dã yana da wata tsãwa ko kuma ya yi sauna kan bangon da aka raba shi. Babu da muhimmin mai amfani da jama'a wa madaidaici, babu wani masu buƙata masu fassarar-bayani ga kurarin takardar masu yawa. For this reason, we propose a novel discriminative marginalized probabilistic method (DAMEN) trained to discriminate critical information from a cluster of topic-related medical documents and generate a multi-document summary via token probability marginalization.  Matarinta na gaskata ko za'a gabatar da halin-the-art kan a matsayin maɓallin da aka yi wa matsayin da multi-dokuman ƙararinsa na littãfin na'ura. Kayya, za mu sami karatun masu kamfani da za'a yi kwaɗayi wa zaɓen hanyarka kuma mu gaskata muhimu ga kowace moduli na hanyonmu.", 'sk': 'Čeprav so sedanje najsodobnejše rešitve, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih, uspešne v širokem naboru opravil NLP z enim dokumentom, še vedno težko obravnavajo naloge z več vnosi, kot je povzetek več dokumentov. Številne rešitve skrajšajo vnose in tako ignorirajo morebitne povzetke pomembne vsebine, kar je nesprejemljivo na področju medicine, kjer so lahko vsaka informacija ključna. Drugi uporabljajo linearne približke modelov za uporabo več vhodnih združevanj, kar poslabša rezultate, ker se upoštevajo vse informacije, tudi če so nasprotujoče ali hrupne glede na skupno ozadje. Kljub pomembnosti in družbenemu vplivu medicine ni nobenih ad hoc rešitev za povzetek več dokumentov. Iz tega razloga predlagamo novo diskriminativno marginalizirano probabilistično metodo (DAMEN), usposobljeno za diskriminacijo kritičnih informacij iz skupine tematskih medicinskih dokumentov in ustvarjanje večdokumentnega povzetka prek marginalizacije žetonov verjetnosti. Rezultati dokazujejo, da smo v biomedicinskem naboru podatkov za večdokumentno povzetek sistematičnih pregledov literature boljši od najsodobnejših. Poleg tega izvajamo obsežne študije ablacije, da motiviramo izbiro oblikovanja in dokažemo pomembnost vsakega modula naše metode.', 'jv': 'Candy politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nanging kabeh luwih apik lan nganggo perusahaan sak edam pancen, ora mbok gak perusahaan ads-Hoc kanggo resmi dadi multi-dokumen. Er perusahaan iki, we proposal a rom Diskimitative Marjinalizated likely method yes Nambah, awak dhéwé iso nggawe akeh banter tentang kanggo ngilangno pilihan design lan ujian cara nggawe barang nggawe modul sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé.', 'he': 'למרות שהפתרונות הנוכחיות המאודמות המבוססים על טרנספורטר הצליחו לטווח רחב עבור משימות NLP מסמכים אחד, הם עדיין נאבקים להתמודד עם משימות רבות-כניסה, כמו סדרה רבות-מסמכים. פיתרונות רבים מפחידים את הכניסות, ולכן מתעלמים מהתוכן הסכם-רלוונטי פוטנציאלי, שזה לא מקובל בתחום הרפואי שבו כל מידע יכול להיות חיוני. אחרים משתמשים בהתקרבות של מודל לינרי כדי להשתמש בהתקרבות רבות-כניסה, מחמירות את התוצאות כי כל המידע נחשב, אפילו אם הוא מתנגד או רעש בנוגע לרקע משותף. למרות החשיבות וההשפעה החברתית של הרפואה, אין פתרונות ad hoc לסיום מסמכים רבים. מסיבה זו, אנו מציעים שיטה סיפורית סיפורית מוגבלת חדשה (DAMEN) מאומנת כדי להפריד מידע קריטי מאגרוף של מסמכים רפואיים קשורים לנושא וליצור סכם רב מסמכים באמצעות הסיכוי סיפוריות סיפורי סיפור סיפור סיפור סיפור סיפור סיפור. התוצאות מוכיחות שאנחנו מעלים את המצב המיוחד הקודם על קבוצת נתונים ביולורפואיים למספר מסמכים רבים של ביקורות ספרות שיטתיות. Moreover, we perform extensive ablation studies to motivate the design choices and prove the importance of each module of our method.', 'bo': 'Although current state-of-the-art Transformer-based solutions succeeded in a wide range for single-document NLP tasks, they still struggle to address multi-input tasks such as multi-document summarization. ཐབས་ཤེས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་མང་པོ་སྣང་མེད་བསྐྱུར་བྱེད་དགོས། Others leverage linear model approximations to apply multi-input concatenation, worsening the results because all information is considered, even if it is conflicting or noisy with respect to a shared background. སྨན་གཞུང་གི་གལ་ཆེན་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནོད་དོན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ། ཡིག་ཆ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ང གནད་དོན་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་པའི་ཆེད་དུ་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་པའི་སྐྱེན་བཟོས་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ཅིག་ངེད་ཚོའི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་སྔོན་མའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བསྒྲགས Moreover, we perform extensive ablation studies to motivate the design choices and prove the importance of each module of our method.'}
{'en': 'Efficient Unsupervised Sentence Compression by Fine-tuning Transformers with Reinforcement Learning', 'ar': 'التقطير التدريجي المتناثر: حل التجاوز تحت نموذج التدريب المسبق والفحص الدقيق', 'fr': 'Distillation progressive clairsemée\xa0: résoudre le surajustement sous le paradigme de pré-entraînement et de réglage fin', 'pt': 'Destilação Progressiva Esparsa: Resolvendo o Overfitting sob o Paradigma Pretrain-and-Finetune', 'es': 'Destilación progresiva dispersa: resolución del sobreajuste bajo el paradigma de preentrenamiento y ajuste fino', 'ja': 'スパースプログレッシブ蒸留：プレトレイン・アンド・フィネチューン・パラダイムの下でのオーバーフィッティングの解決', 'zh': '疏渐进式蒸馏:解析拟合于预训微调', 'hi': 'विरल प्रगतिशील आसवन: Pretrain-and-Finetune प्रतिमान के तहत Overfitting को हल करना', 'ru': 'Редкая прогрессивная дистилляция: решение проблемы переоборудования в рамках докризисной и финишной парадигмы', 'ga': 'Driogadh Forásach Gann: Rófheistiú a Réiteach faoi Paradigm Pretrain-and-Finetune', 'ka': 'პარადიგმა პროგრესიგური განსხვავება: წარმოდგენის გადასხვავება Pretrain- and- Finetune პარადიგმა', 'hu': 'Ritka progresszív desztilláció: a Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm túlterhelése', 'el': 'Σπάνια προοδευτική απόσταξη: Επίλυση της αναπροσαρμογής κάτω από το παράδοξο της Πρετρεΐνης και της Φινετούνης', 'it': 'Distillazione progressiva sparsa: risoluzione del sovrafitting sotto il paradigma Pretrain-and-Finetune', 'lt': 'Spartus progresyvus distiliavimas: perteklinio įrengimo sprendimas pagal pretraino ir finetuno paradigmą', 'kk': 'Кеңіл жылдамдық бөлшектеу: Pretrain- and- Finetune Paradigm астындағы бөлшектеу', 'mk': 'Брза прогресивна дистилација: решавање на прекувременоста под парадигмот Претрејн и финетун', 'ms': 'Distillasi Progresif Sederhana: Menyelesaikan Pemasangan Terlebihan di bawah Paradigm Pretrain-and-Finetune', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн хөгжлийн халдвар: Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm-ын доор шийдвэрлэх', 'mt': 'Distillazzjoni Progressiva Sparsa: Riżoluzzjoni tat-tagħmir żejjed taħt il-Paradigma Pretrain-and-Finetune', 'ml': 'സ്പെയിസ് പ്രോഗ്രാഗ്രാവിന്\u200dറെ ഡിസ്റ്റിലേഷന്\u200d', 'no': 'Sparse Progressive Distillation: Resolver overfitting under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'sr': 'Sparse Progressive Distillation: Resolving Overfitting under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'pl': 'Rządka destylacja postępowa: rozwiązywanie nadmiernego dopasowania w ramach paradygmatu pretrajnego i finetune', 'ro': 'Distilarea progresivă slabă: rezolvarea suprapunerii sub Paradigmul Pretrain-and-Finetune', 'si': 'ස්පාර්ස් ප්\u200dරධාන විශාලනය: ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන් සහ ෆින්ටුන් පැරැඩිග්ම් වල ප්\u200dරධාන විශාලනය', 'so': 'Kalajarida koorsooyinka horumarinta: Heshiiska habboonshaha ka hooseeya baaritaanka hore- iyo Finetune', 'ta': 'ஸ்பாய்ஸ் முன்னேற்றம் தீர்வு', 'sv': 'Sparse Progressive Destillation: Lösa övertillning under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'ur': 'پرٹرین اور فینٹونی جنت کے نیچے مزید مزید مزید تفاوت ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cắt ngang ngang nhỏ: Làm mờ thuốc dưới Paradigm chuẩn sẵn sẵn', 'bg': 'Спасна прогресивна дестилация: решаване на свръхприспособяването под предтрен-финетната парадигма', 'hr': 'Progresivna destilacija: rješavanje nadmetanja pod paradigmom Pretrain i Finetune', 'da': 'Sparse Progressive Destillation: Løsning af overfitting under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'nl': 'Sparse Progressieve Destillatie: Overfitting oplossen onder Pretrain-en-Finetune paradigma', 'de': 'Sparse Progressive Destillation: Überfitting unter Pretrain-und-Finetune-Paradigma lösen', 'id': 'Distillasi Progresif Ganti: Menyelesaikan Overfitting di bawah Paradigm Pretrain-and-Finetune', 'ko': '희소 점진 증류:Pretrain과Finetune 모드에서 과도한 의합 해결', 'fa': 'Distillation Progressive Sparse: Resolving Overfitting under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'sw': 'Tofauti la Kihispania: Kuishia Kushindwa Kushindwa chini ya Mpango wa Mafunzo na Matokeo', 'tr': 'Sparse Progressive Distillation: Resolving Overfitting under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'af': 'Sparse Progressive Distillation: Oplos Oorvloediging onder Pretrain-en-Finetune Paradigm', 'sq': 'Distillimi i shpejtë Progresiv: Zgjidhja e mbipajtimit nën Paradigmin e Pretrain-dhe-Finetune', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Պրետրեյնի և ֆինետունի պարադիգմայի տակ գոյություն ունի', 'az': '칐n칲m칲zdeki t톛dbirlik: Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigmu alt캼nda 칞톛kilm톛k', 'bn': 'স্পের্স প্রোগ্রেসিভ ডিস্টিলেশন: প্রেট্রেন- এবং- ফিনিউটাইন প্যারাডিগ্রামের অধীনে অতিরিক্ত মিলিয়ে নে', 'bs': 'Sparse Progressive Distillation: Resolving Overfitting under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'ca': 'Destillació Progressiva ràpida: Resoldre la superadaptació sota el paradigma de pretrain i finetune', 'et': 'Haruldane progressiivne destilleerimine: liigse paigaldamise lahendamine eelneva ja finetuuni paradigmi alusel', 'cs': 'Řídká progresivní destilace: řešení nadměrného přizpůsobení podle předmětného a finetunového paradigma', 'fi': 'Sparse Progressive Distillation: Ylisovituksen ratkaiseminen Pretrain-and-Finetune-Paradigmissa', 'sk': 'Redka progresivna destilacija: odpravljanje prevelikega prilagajanja pod pretrajno-finetunsko paradigmo', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Sparse Progressive Distillation: Resolving Overfitting under Pretrain-and-Finetune Paradigm', 'he': 'דיסטילציה מתקדמת מהירה: לפתור התאמה יתר תחת פרטריין ופינטון', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects'}
{'en': 'Sentence compression reduces the length of text by removing non-essential content while preserving important facts and grammaticality. Unsupervised objective driven methods for sentence compression can be used to create customized models without the need for ground-truth training data, while allowing flexibility in the objective function(s) that are used for learning and inference. Recent unsupervised sentence compression approaches use custom objectives to guide discrete search; however, guided search is expensive at inference time. In this work, we explore the use of reinforcement learning to train effective sentence compression models that are also fast when generating predictions. In particular, we cast the task as binary sequence labelling and fine-tune a pre-trained transformer using a simple policy gradient approach. Our approach outperforms other unsupervised models while also being more efficient at inference time.', 'ar': 'الحكمة التقليدية في تشذيب النماذج اللغوية المستندة إلى المحولات هي أن التقليم يقلل من تعبير النموذج ، وبالتالي من المرجح أن يكون غير مناسب بدلاً من الإفراط في التجهيز. ومع ذلك ، في ظل نموذج الإجهاد المسبق والدقائق الرائجة ، نفترض فرضية تقليدية مضادة ، وهي: يزيد التقليم من خطر التجهيز الزائد عند إجرائه في مرحلة الضبط الدقيق. في هذه الورقة ، نهدف إلى معالجة مشكلة فرط التجهيز وتحسين أداء التقليم من خلال تقطير المعرفة التدريجي بخصائص مرتبطة بالخطأ. نظهر لأول مرة أن الحد من مخاطر التجهيز الزائد يمكن أن يساعد في فعالية التقليم في ظل نموذج الإجهاد المسبق والضبط الدقيق. تُظهر دراسات وتجارب الاجتثاث على مقياس GLUE أن طريقتنا تتفوق على المنافسين الرئيسيين في المهام المختلفة.', 'es': 'La sabiduría convencional en la poda de los modelos de lenguaje basados en Transformer es que la poda reduce la expresividad del modelo y, por lo tanto, es más probable que no se ajuste bien que demasiado. Sin embargo, bajo el paradigma de preentrenamiento y ajuste de tendencias, postulamos una hipótesis contra-tradicional, es decir: la poda aumenta el riesgo de sobreajuste cuando se realiza en la fase de ajuste fino. En este artículo, nuestro objetivo es abordar el problema del sobreajuste y mejorar el rendimiento de la poda a través de la destilación progresiva del conocimiento con propiedades ligadas a errores. Demostramos por primera vez que reducir el riesgo de sobreajuste puede ayudar a la eficacia de la poda bajo el paradigma de preentrenamiento y ajuste fino. Los estudios y experimentos de ablación en el punto de referencia GLUE muestran que nuestro método supera a los principales competidores en diferentes tareas.', 'pt': 'A sabedoria convencional na poda de modelos de linguagem baseados em Transformer é que a poda reduz a expressividade do modelo e, portanto, é mais provável que subajuste em vez de superajuste. No entanto, sob o paradigma de pré-treinamento e ajuste fino, postulamos uma hipótese contra-tradicional, ou seja: a poda aumenta o risco de overfitting quando realizada na fase de ajuste fino. Neste artigo, nosso objetivo é abordar o problema de overfitting e melhorar o desempenho da poda por meio da destilação progressiva do conhecimento com propriedades limitadas a erros. Mostramos pela primeira vez que a redução do risco de overfitting pode ajudar na eficácia da poda sob o paradigma de pré-treinamento e ajuste fino. Estudos e experimentos de ablação no benchmark GLUE mostram que nosso método supera os principais concorrentes em diferentes tarefas.', 'fr': "La sagesse conventionnelle dans l'élagage des modèles de langage basés sur Transformer est que l'élagage réduit l'expressivité du modèle et est donc plus susceptible de sous-adapter plutôt que de surajuster. Cependant, dans le paradigme de tendance préentraînement et réglage fin, nous postulons une hypothèse contre-traditionnelle, à savoir que l'élagage augmente le risque de surajustement lorsqu'il est effectué lors de la phase de réglage fin. Dans cet article, nous visons à résoudre le problème du surajustement et à améliorer les performances de taille grâce à une distillation progressive des connaissances avec des propriétés liées aux erreurs. Nous montrons pour la première fois que la réduction du risque de surajustement peut contribuer à l'efficacité de la taille selon le paradigme du pré-entraînement et du réglage fin. Des études et des expériences d'ablation sur le banc d'essai GLUE montrent que notre méthode surpasse les principales concurrentes dans différentes tâches.", 'ja': 'Transformerベースの言語モデルの枝刈りにおける従来の知恵は、枝刈りがモデルの表現力を低下させるため、オーバーフィットではなくアンダーフィットになりやすいことです。しかし、傾向的な事前訓練とファインチューンのパラダイムの下で、私たちは反伝統的な仮説を仮定します。つまり、微調整フェーズで実行されると、枝刈りは過剰適合のリスクを増加させます。本稿では，誤差限界特性を有するプログレッシブ知識蒸留による過適合問題への対処と剪定性能の向上を目指す．私たちは、オーバーフィッティングのリスクを減らすことが、プレトレインとファインチューンのパラダイムの下での枝刈りの有効性を助けることができることを初めて示しました。アブレーションの研究とグルーベンチマークの実験は、当社の方法が異なるタスクで大手競合他社を上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '夫剪基于 Transformer 言,剪则损其表现力,故有可不拟合而非拟合者。 然而,在趋势的预练和微调范式下,我们假设了一个反旧的假设,即:修剪在微调阶段行时增加过拟合的风险。 于本文之中,旨在差谬之渐进式蒸馏以决过拟合而崇剪伐。 首证,降过拟合之险有助于预练微调之有效性。 GLUE 准之消实验,异务之先竞争对手。', 'ru': 'Традиционная мудрость в обрезке языковых моделей на основе трансформаторов заключается в том, что обрезка снижает выразительность модели и, таким образом, скорее всего, не будет соответствовать, а не будет соответствовать. Однако, в рамках трендовой парадигмы prerain-and-finetune, мы постулируем контр-традиционную гипотезу, то есть: обрезка увеличивает риск переобустройства при выполнении на этапе тонкой настройки. В этой статье мы стремимся решить проблему переобустройства и улучшить производительность обрезки за счет прогрессивной дистилляции знаний со свойствами, связанными с ошибками. Мы впервые демонстрируем, что снижение риска переобустройства может способствовать повышению эффективности обрезки в рамках докризисной парадигмы. Исследования абляции и эксперименты по эталону КЛЕЯ показывают, что наш метод превосходит ведущих конкурентов по различным задачам.', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित भाषा मॉडल की छंटाई में पारंपरिक ज्ञान यह है कि छंटाई मॉडल अभिव्यंजकता को कम कर देती है और इस प्रकार ओवरफिट के बजाय अंडरफिट होने की अधिक संभावना है। हालांकि, ट्रेंडिंग प्रीट्रेन-एंड-फाइनट्यून प्रतिमान के तहत, हम एक काउंटर-पारंपरिक परिकल्पना को मानते हैं, अर्थात: छंटाई ठीक-ट्यूनिंग चरण में प्रदर्शन करने पर ओवरफिटिंग के जोखिम को बढ़ाती है। इस पेपर में, हम overfitting समस्या को संबोधित करने और त्रुटि-बाध्य गुणों के साथ प्रगतिशील ज्ञान आसवन के माध्यम से छंटाई प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। हम पहली बार दिखाते हैं कि ओवरफिटिंग के जोखिम को कम करने से प्रीट्रेन-एंड-फाइनट्यून प्रतिमान के तहत छंटाई की प्रभावशीलता में मदद मिल सकती है। GLUE बेंचमार्क पर एब्लेशन अध्ययन और प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि विभिन्न कार्यों में अग्रणी प्रतियोगियों को मात देती है।', 'ga': 'Is í an ghaois thraidisiúnta maidir le múnlaí teanga atá bunaithe ar an gclaochladán a bhearradh ná go laghdaíonn bearradh sainléiriú na samhla agus dá bhrí sin is dóichí go mbeidh sé tearcfheistithe seachas rófheisteas. Mar sin féin, faoin bparaidím réamhthraenála-agus-fíneitín treochta, déanaimid hipitéis fhriththraidisiúnta a chur i láthair, is é sin: méadaíonn bearradh an baol go ndéanfar rófheisteas nuair a dhéantar é ag céim an mhionchoigeartaithe. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn aghaidh a thabhairt ar fhadhb an rófheistithe agus feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht bearradh trí dhriogadh forásach eolais a bhfuil airíonna earráid-bhainte aige. Léirímid don chéad uair gur féidir le laghdú ar an mbaol rófheistithe cabhrú le héifeachtacht bearradh faoin bparadigm pretrain-and-finetune. Léiríonn staidéir ablation agus turgnaimh ar thagarmharc GLUE go sáraíonn ár modh na príomh-iomaitheoirí thar thascanna éagsúla.', 'ka': 'კონგენციონალური მეცნიერება ტრანფორმეტრის ბაზრებული ენის მოდელში არის ის, რომ კონფიგურაცია მოდელური გამოსახულებულობას შემცირებს და ამიტომ უფრო შესაძლებელია დასრულ მაგრამ, რრენდენციური პრერეინ-და-ფინეტუნის პარადიგმა ქვემოთ, ჩვენ პოსტულაცით კონტრაციონალური ჰიპოტეზას, ეს არის: პრენდენცია უფრო მეტივს პრისკესი, როდესაც გავაკეთება კ ამ დოგომაში ჩვენ მინდომით გავაკეთოთ სამყარო პრობლემა და გავაკეთოთ პროგრესიური ცნობილის განსხვავება შეცდომის შესახებ. ჩვენ პირველი ოჯერ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ უფრო დამატებული რისკი შეუძლიათ წარმოდგენის ეფექტიურობას დახმარება პარადიგმა წარმოდგენის და ტინეტუნის პარა აბლაციის კვლევები და ექსპერიმენტები GLUE ბენქმარკში ჩვენი მეტი უფრო გავაკეთება პირველი კონპერიმენტები განსხვავებული საქმედებში.', 'el': 'Η συμβατική σοφία στο κλάδεμα γλωσσικών μοντέλων βασισμένων στον μετασχηματιστή είναι ότι το κλάδεμα μειώνει την εκφραστικότητα του μοντέλου και επομένως είναι πιο πιθανό να υποβαθμιστεί παρά να υπερβεί. Ωστόσο, σύμφωνα με το εξελισσόμενο πρότυπο προ-ρύθμισης και λεπτομέρειας, θέτουμε μια αντίθετη υπόθεση, δηλαδή: το κλάδεμα αυξάνει τον κίνδυνο υπερπροσαρμογής όταν εκτελείται στη φάση της λεπτομέρειας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, στοχεύουμε στην αντιμετώπιση του προβλήματος υπερπροσαρμογής και στη βελτίωση της απόδοσης κλαδέματος μέσω προοδευτικής απόσταξης γνώσης με ιδιότητες που δεσμεύονται από σφάλματα. Δείχνουμε για πρώτη φορά ότι η μείωση του κινδύνου υπερβολικής προσαρμογής μπορεί να βοηθήσει στην αποτελεσματικότητα του κλαδέματος υπό το πρότυπο προ-ρύθμισης και συντονισμού. Μελέτες Ablation και πειράματα στο σημείο αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τους κορυφαίους ανταγωνιστές σε διάφορα καθήκοντα.', 'hu': 'A transzformátor alapú nyelvi modellek metszésének hagyományos bölcsessége, hogy a metszés csökkenti a modell expresszivitását, így valószínűbb, hogy alulfér, mint túlfér. A trendező előzetes és finomhangolás paradigmában azonban ellenhagyományos hipotézist tételezünk fel, azaz a finomhangolási fázisban végzett metszés növeli a túlzott illeszkedés kockázatát. Ebben a tanulmányban a túlterhelési problémát kívánjuk kezelni és javítani a metszési teljesítményt progresszív, hibakötő tulajdonságokkal rendelkező disztillációval. Első alkalommal mutatjuk be, hogy a túlfeszültség kockázatának csökkentése segíthet a metszés hatékonyságában a finomhangolás előtti paradigma szerint. A GLUE referenciaértéken végzett ablációs tanulmányok és kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk különböző feladatokban felülmúlja a vezető versenytársakat.', 'it': "La saggezza convenzionale nella potatura dei modelli linguistici basati su Transformer è che la potatura riduce l'espressività del modello e quindi è più probabile che si sottofit piuttosto che sovrafit. Tuttavia, secondo il paradigma trending pretrain-and-finetune, postuliamo un'ipotesi controtradizionale, cioè: la potatura aumenta il rischio di sovrafitting quando eseguita in fase di fine tuning. In questo articolo, miriamo ad affrontare il problema dell'overfitting e migliorare le prestazioni di potatura tramite distillazione progressiva a conoscenza con proprietà legate agli errori. Dimostriamo per la prima volta che ridurre il rischio di sovrafitting può aiutare l'efficacia della potatura secondo il paradigma pretrain-and-finetune. Gli studi di ablazione e gli esperimenti sul benchmark GLUE mostrano che il nostro metodo supera i principali concorrenti in diversi compiti.", 'kk': 'Түрлендіруші тіл үлгілерінде кәдімгі білікті - бұл үлгілер үлгілікті көшірмелейді, сондықтан бұл үлгілерді көшірмелейді. Бірақ тенденциялық pretrain-and-finetune парадигмінің астында, біз қарсы әдетті гипотезаны келтіреміз, мысалы: бұл қарсы тәртіптеу кезінде өзгертуге болатын тәуелсіз. Бұл қағазда, біз мәселелерді өзгерту және қате қасиеттерімен өзгерту үшін білім дисплейлерін өзгерту үшін мақсатымыз. Біз бірінші рет бұл жерде өзгерту тәуелсіздігін көмектесе аламыз. GLUE бағдарламалық зерттеулері мен тәжірибелер тәртібіміздің әдіміміз әртүрлі тапсырмалардың бастағы конкуренттерін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Įprasta išmintis apslėpti transformatoriais pagrįstus kalbinius modelius yra ta, kad apslėpti sumažėja modelio išraiška ir todėl labiau tikėtina, kad jis nepakankamai tinka, o ne pernelyg gerai tinka. Vis dėlto, pagal tendencijas iki traukinio ir tobulinimo, mes darome prieštaraujančią hipotezę, t. y. smulkinimas padidina pertekliaus įrengimo riziką, kai atliekama tobulinimo etape. In this paper,  we aim to address the overfitting problem and improve pruning performance via progressive knowledge distillation with error-bound properties.  Pirmą kartą parodome, kad pertekliaus įrengimo rizikos mažinimas gali padėti efektyviai nuplauti, taikant priešlietinio ir nuodugnio modelį. Abliacijos tyrimai ir GLUE lyginamojo rodiklio eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas viršija pagrindinius konkurentus įvairiose užduotyse.', 'mk': 'Конвенционалната мудрост во пробивањето на моделите на јазик базирани на трансформи е дека пробивањето ја намалува експресивноста на моделот и со тоа е поверојатно дека ќе биде недоодговарано отколку преодговарано. Сепак, под трендирачкиот парадигм на предожд и финетуирање, постулираме контрадиционална хипотеза, што значи: прскањето го зголемува ризикот на преприлагодување кога се изведува во финетуирачката фаза. Во овој документ, ние имаме за цел да го решиме проблемот со премногу обврзување и да ја подобриме резултатот на исцепувањето преку прогресивна дистилација на знаење со сопствености поврзани со грешки. За прв пат покажуваме дека намалувањето на ризикот на премногу обладување може да помогне во ефикасноста на прскањето под парадигмата на предожд и финетизација. Студиите за аблација и експериментите на benchmark GLUE покажуваат дека нашиот метод ги надминува водечките конкуренти во различни задачи.', 'ms': 'Kebijaksanaan konvensional dalam pemotongan model bahasa berasaskan-Transformer ialah pemotongan mengurangkan ekspresif model dan oleh itu lebih mungkin untuk tidak cocok daripada terlalu cocok. Bagaimanapun, di bawah paradigm a pretrain-and-finetune yang berkembang, kita berpostulasi hipotesis anti-tradisional, iaitu: pruning meningkatkan risiko overfitting apabila dilakukan pada fase fine-tuning. Dalam kertas ini, kami bertujuan untuk mengatasi masalah overfitting dan meningkatkan prestasi pruning melalui pengetahuan progresif distillation dengan ciri-ciri terikat ralat. Kami menunjukkan untuk pertama kalinya bahawa mengurangi risiko pemasangan berlebihan boleh membantu efektivitas pemotongan di bawah paradigma pretrain-and-finetune. Ujian dan eksperimen pembolehan pada tanda referensi GLUE menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melebihi kompetitor utama melalui tugas yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d സാധാരണ ജ്ഞാനം കാണിക്കുന്നത് മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാഷണത്തെ കുറവാക്കുന However, under the trending pretrain-and-finetune paradigm, we postulate a counter-traditional hypothesis, that is: pruning increases the risk of overfitting when performed at the fine-tuning phase.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് മാറ്റുന്ന പ്രകടനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച്  ആദ്യമായി നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അപകടത്തിന്റെ അപകടത്തിന് കുറവ് വരുത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. പ്രെയി GLUE ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d അബ്ലേറ്റിന്\u200dറെ പഠനങ്ങളും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളും കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ജോലികള', 'mt': 'Għarfien konvenzjonali fil-pruning tal-mudelli lingwistiċi bbażati fuq it-Transformer huwa li l-pruning inaqqas l-espressività tal-mudell u għalhekk huwa aktar probabbli li ma jkunx tajjeb biżżejjed. Madankollu, taħt il-paradigm a tendenti ta’ qabel it-tixrid u l-irfinar, a ħna nipostulaw ipoteżi kontrotradizzjonali, jiġifieri: il-pruning iżid ir-riskju ta’ tagħmir żejjed meta jsir fil-fażi ta’ rfinar. F’dan id-dokument, għandna l-għan li nindirizzaw il-problema tat-tagħmir żejjed u jtejbu l-prestazzjoni tal-pruning permezz ta’ distillazzjoni progressiva tal-għarfien bi proprjetajiet marbuta mal-iżbalji. Aħna nuru għall-ewwel darba li t-tnaqqis tar-riskju ta’ tagħmir żejjed jista’ jgħin fl-effettività tal-pruning taħt il-paradigma ta’ qabel ix-xita u l-irfinar. Studji dwar l-abbolazzjoni u esperimenti dwar il-punt ta’ riferiment tal-GLUE juru li l-metodu tagħna jaqbeż il-kompetituri ewlenin f’kompiti differenti.', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэн хэл загваруудыг удирдлагатай ухаан нь загварын илэрхийллийг багасгаж байгаа юм. Иймээс илүү төвөгтэй байх боломжтой. Гэхдээ бид уламжлалтын эсрэг арга баримтуудыг дахин дахин дахин дахин дэвшүүлэх эрсдэлийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид асуудлыг асуудлын тухай бодох, хөгжлийн мэдлэгтэй хуваалцах аргаар алдаа холбогдсон байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд зориулсан. Бид анхны удаа давхарлах эрсдэлийг багасгаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж чадна. GLUE банкомарк дээрх алдагдлын судалгаа болон туршилтууд бидний арга нь олон даалгавар дээрх удирдагчдыг илүүтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Konvensjonell vitenskap i uttrykk av transformeringsspråk-modeller er at uttrykk reduserer uttrykket av modellen, og derfor er det mest sannsynleg å underpassa i staden for å overpassa. Men under den trendige paradigmen pretrain-og-finetune, postularer vi ein kontratradisjonell hypotese, som er: pruning øker risikoen for å overpassa når det er utført i fine-tuning-fasen. I denne papiret må vi handsama overpassende problemet og forbetra opprinneligheten ved å distillera framtidig kunnskap med feilbinde eigenskapar. Vi viser for første gong at reduksjonen av risikoen for overfitting kan hjelpa til effektiviteten for å prøva under paradigmet pretrain-og-finetune. Følgjande studier og eksperimenter på GLUE-benchmarket viser at metoden vårt utfører dei første konkurentene over ulike oppgåver.', 'pl': 'Konwencjonalną mądrością w przycinaniu modeli językowych opartych na Transformerze jest to, że przycinanie zmniejsza ekspresywność modelu i tym samym bardziej prawdopodobne jest, że nie nadmierne dopasowanie. Jednak zgodnie z trendującym paradygmatem pretrain-and-finetune postulujemy kontrtradycyjną hipotezę, czyli: przycinanie zwiększa ryzyko nadmiernego dopasowania w fazie dostrajania. Celem niniejszego artykułu jest rozwiązanie problemu nadmiernego dopasowania i poprawa wydajności przycinania poprzez progresywną destylację wiedzy o właściwościach związanych z błędami. Po raz pierwszy pokazujemy, że zmniejszenie ryzyka nadmiernego dopasowania może pomóc w efektywności przycinania w ramach paradygmatu pretrain-and-finetune. Badania ablacyjne i eksperymenty na poziomie GLUE pokazują, że nasza metoda przewyższa wiodących konkurentów w różnych zadaniach.', 'ro': 'Înțelepciunea convențională în tăierea modelelor de limbaj bazate pe transformator este că tăierea reduce expresivitatea modelului și, prin urmare, este mai probabil să subpotrivească mai degrabă decât să suprapotrivească. Cu toate acestea, în cadrul paradigmei tendințelor pretrain-and-finetune, postulăm o ipoteză contra-tradițională, și anume: tăierea crește riscul de supraamenajare atunci când se efectuează în faza de reglare fină. În această lucrare, ne propunem să abordăm problema suprasolicitării și să îmbunătățim performanța de tăiere prin distilarea progresivă a cunoștințelor cu proprietăți legate de erori. Demonstrăm pentru prima dată că reducerea riscului de supraamenajare poate contribui la eficiența tăierii în cadrul paradigmei pre-și-finetunare. Studiile de ablație și experimentele efectuate pe benchmark GLUE arată că metoda noastră depășește competitorii de top în diferite sarcini.', 'sr': 'Konvencionalna mudrost u pružanju jezičkih modela na transformeru je da pružanje smanjuje model izraziteljstvo i tako je vjerojatno da će se ne uklopiti umjesto da se uklopi. Međutim, pod trending pretrain-i-finetun paradigmom, postulavamo kontratradicionalnu hipotezu, to je: pružanje povećava rizik od preuključenja kada je provedena u fazi fino prilagođenja. U ovom papiru, mi ciljamo da riješimo problem koji odgovara i poboljšamo provedbu pružanja putem progresivne destilacije znanja sa svojstvima povezanim sa greškama. Prvi put pokazujemo da smanjenje rizika od preuređenja može pomoći učinkovitosti pružanja pod paradigmom pretkiša i finetuna. Istraživanja i eksperimenti u skloništu GLUE pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi vodeće konkurente u različitim zadacima.', 'so': "Xigmadda ku saabsan qaababka luuqada ee hore ee lagu soo jeedo waa in cuntooyinku hoos u dhigto muuqashada muuqashada, sidaas darteed waxaa ka suurtowda in ay ka dhici karto wax aan daboolin. However, under the trending pretrain-and-finetune paradigm, we postulate a counter-traditional hypothesis, that is: pruning increases the risk of overfitting when performed at the fine-tuning phase.  Warqaddan, waxaynu ku talo galaynaa dhibaatada aad u baahan tahay, waxaana ku hagaajinaynaa horumarinta aqoonta horumarinta ah oo ku kala soocno waxyaabaha qaladka ku xidhan. Marka ugu horeysa waxan tusnaynaa in khatarka daboolidda lagu soo dejiyo uu caawinayo faa'iidada ku saabsan baaritaanka ka hooseeya sharciga hore iyo faa'iidada faa'iidada. Waxbarashada iyo imtixaanka ku saabsan bangiga GLUE wuxuu muujiyaa in qaabkeenkeenu ay ka muuqato kuwa hogaamiya shaqada kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Konventionell visdom i beskärning Transformer-baserade språkmodeller är att beskärning minskar modellens uttrycksfullhet och därmed är mer benägen att underpassa snarare än överpassa. Men under trendparadigmet pre-and-finetune postulerar vi en kontratraditionell hypotes, det vill säga: beskärning ökar risken för överpassning när den utförs i finjusteringsfasen. I denna uppsats syftar vi till att ta itu med problemet med överpassning och förbättra beskärningsprestandan genom progressiv kunskapsdestillation med felbundna egenskaper. Vi visar för första gången att minska risken för överpassning kan bidra till effektiviteten av beskärning enligt paradigmet pre-and-finetune. Ablationsstudier och experiment på GLUE-riktmärket visar att vår metod överträffar de ledande konkurrenterna inom olika uppgifter.', 'ta': 'Conventional wisdom in pruning Transformer-based language models is that pruning reduces the model expressiveness and thus is more likely to underfit rather than overfit.  ஆனால், நடக்கும் போது முன்னோக்கி மற்றும் பின்னூட்டுன் அளபுருக்கத்தின் கீழ், நாம் எதிர்பார்ந்த மரபார்ந்த ஹிப்யூடியோசனை அனுப்புகிறோம்,  இந்த காகிதத்தில், மிகப்பெரிய பிரச்சனையைத் தேர்ந்தெடுக்க நாம் நோக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் முன்னேற்ற அறிவு பிரிவு ப முதல் முறை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் அது பெருக்கும் ஆபத்தை குறைக்கும் என்று காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் முதல் முறை பெரும் ப GLUE பெங்க்மார்க் மீது ஆப்லேட் ஆராய்ச்சிகள் மற்றும் பரிசோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் முறைமை வேறு வேலைகளில் முன', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක් අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dය නමුත්, ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරින් සහ-ෆින්ටුන් පාර්ඩිග්ම් වලින්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා, ඒක තමයි: ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ අපි පළමු වතාව පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙලාවෙන් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරිත්\u200dරේන් සහ ෆින්ටුන් පාර්ඩිග්ම් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව GLUE බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වල අවශ්\u200dය අධ්\u200dයානය සහ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ විධානය වෙනස් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙ', 'ur': 'ترفنٹر کی بنیادی زبان نمڈلوں میں معمولی حکمت یہ ہے کہ ترفنٹر کی نمڈلوں کو ترفنٹر کی کم کر دیتا ہے اور اس طرح بہت زیادہ احتمال ہے کہ زیادہ مضبوط ہو جاتا ہے۔ However, the trending pretrain and finetune paradigm, we postulate a counter-traditional hypothesis, that is: pruning increases the risk of overfitting when performed at the fine tuning phase. اس کاغذ میں، ہم اس مشکل کو حل کرنے کا ارادہ رکھتے ہیں اور پریشان علم کی تفریق کے ذریعہ سے پریشان کرنا کا ارادہ رکھتے ہیں. ہم پہلی بار دکھاتے ہیں کہ زیادہ دکھانے کے خطرے کاٹ دیتا ہے کہ زیادہ دکھانے کے قابل کامیابی کی مدد کرتی ہے GLUE بنچممارک پر قابل تحقیقات اور آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ مختلف کاموں میں پیشوا مسابقات کرنے والوں کو زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Transformer-asosiy til modellarini o'rganishda davom etish imkoniyatli, model hisobotini kamaytirish imkoniyatini kamaytirish mumkin va shunday qilishiga o'xshash mumkin. Ho'sh, ko'rib chiqqan prerain va finetun paradigligi paytda, biz anti-traditional hypoteyasini qo'yishmiz. Bu esa, yaxshi darajada bajarilganda ko'paytirilganda ko'proq hayotini oshirish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz ko'p muammolarni boshqarishni istaysizki va xato bogʻliq xossalari bilan taʼminlovchi darajada o'zgarishni bajaramiz. Biz birinchi marta ko'rsatganimiz, o'zgarishning xavflini kamaytirish qo'llanmagan o'zgarishga yordam beradi. Ablation studies and experiments on the GLUE benchmark show that our method outperforms the leading competitors across different tasks.", 'vi': 'Thông thái thông thường trong việc cắt giảm các mô hình ngôn ngữ biến hình là việc cắt giảm khả năng biểu lộ của mô hình và do đó có khả năng không phù hợp hơn là bỏ qua nó. Tuy nhiên, dưới dạng mô hình premưa và tinh tế, chúng tôi đưa ra một giả thuyết ngược truyền thống, có nghĩa là việc cắt giảm nguy cơ bay nhiều khi được thực hiện tại giai đoạn độ chín. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi hướng tới giải quyết vấn đề giảm cân và cải thiện khả năng cắt tỉa qua việc chưng cất kiến thức tiến bộ với các tính chất sai. Chúng tôi cho thấy lần đầu tiên, giảm nguy cơ bay quá mức có thể giúp hiệu quả việc cắt tỉa dưới biểu tượng premưa và tinh tế. Nghiên cứu và thử nghiệm trên tiêu chuẩn GLUE cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội các đối thủ hàng đầu trong các công việc khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Конвенционалната мъдрост при подрязването на езикови модели, базирани на трансформатори, е, че подрязването намалява изразителността на модела и по този начин е по-вероятно да не се вписва, отколкото да се пренебрегва. Въпреки това, под тенденцията на парадигмата преди тренировка и фина настройка, ние постулираме контратрадиционна хипотеза, а именно: подрязването увеличава риска от пренасочване, когато се извършва във фазата на фина настройка. В тази статия ние се стремим да се справим с проблема с пренасочването и да подобрим ефективността на подрязването чрез прогресивна дестилация на знания с свойства, обвързани с грешки. За първи път показваме, че намаляването на риска от пренасочване може да помогне за ефективността на подрязването при парадигмата преди тренировка и фина настройка. Проучванията и експериментите на бенчмарка показват, че методът ни превъзхожда водещите конкуренти при различни задачи.', 'da': 'Konventionel visdom i beskæring Transformer-baserede sprogmodeller er, at beskæring reducerer modellens udtryksevne og dermed er mere tilbøjelige til at underpasse snarere end overpasse. Men under det trending pre-and-finetune paradigme postulerer vi en kontratraditionel hypotese, det vil sige: beskæring øger risikoen for overfitting, når det udføres i finjusteringsfasen. I denne artikel har vi til formål at løse problemet med overfitting og forbedre beskæringsydelsen via progressiv viden destillation med fejlbundne egenskaber. Vi viser for første gang, at reduktion af risikoen for overtilpasning kan hjælpe effektiviteten af beskæring under paradigmet pre-and-finetune. Ablationsundersøgelser og eksperimenter på GLUE benchmark viser, at vores metode overgår de førende konkurrenter på tværs af forskellige opgaver.', 'hr': 'Konvencionalna mudrost obrijanja jezičkih modela na transformeri je da obrijanje smanjuje model izraziteljstvo i tako je vjerojatnije da će se ne uklapati umjesto preuklapa. Međutim, pod treniranom paradigmom pretrain-i-finetuna, postulavamo kontratradicionalnu hipotezu, to je: pružanje povećava rizik od prekopterećenja kada se provede na fazi isprave. U ovom papiru, mi ciljamo riješiti problem koji se uklapa i poboljšati provedbu pružanja putem progresivne destilacije znanja s vlasništvom povezanim s pogreškama. Po prvi put pokazujemo da smanjenje rizika od preusmjerenja može pomoći učinkovitosti pružanja pod paradigmom pretkiša i finetuna. Istraživanja i eksperimenti u skloništu GLUE pokazuju da naša metoda nadmašuje vodeće konkurente u različitim zadatkima.', 'nl': 'Conventionele wijsheid in het snoeien Transformer-gebaseerde taalmodellen is dat snoeien de expressiviteit van het model vermindert en dus eerder onderpast dan overfit. Onder het trending pretrain-en-finetune paradigma postuleren we echter een tegentraditionele hypothese, dat wil zeggen: snoeien verhoogt het risico van overfitting wanneer uitgevoerd in de finetuning fase. In dit artikel willen we het probleem van overfitting aanpakken en de snoeiprestaties verbeteren door progressieve kennisdestillatie met foutgebonden eigenschappen. We laten voor het eerst zien dat het verminderen van het risico op overfitting de effectiviteit van snoeien onder het pretrain-and-finetune paradigma kan helpen. Ablatiestudies en experimenten op de GLUE benchmark tonen aan dat onze methode de toonaangevende concurrenten overtreft bij verschillende taken.', 'de': 'Konventionelle Weisheit beim Beschneiden Transformer-basierter Sprachmodelle ist, dass Beschneiden die Modellexpressivität reduziert und daher eher unterbewertet als überbewertet. Unter dem trendigen Pretrain-and-Finetune-Paradigma postulieren wir jedoch eine kontrasttraditionelle Hypothese, das heißt: Beschneiden erhöht das Risiko einer Überanpassung, wenn es in der Feinabstimmungsphase durchgeführt wird. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir das Problem des Überfittings angehen und die Schnittleistung durch progressive Wissensdestillation mit fehlerbezogenen Eigenschaften verbessern. Wir zeigen erstmals, dass die Verringerung des Risikos einer Überanpassung die Effektivität des Beschnitts unter dem Prätrain-and-Finetune-Paradigma unterstützen kann. Ablationsstudien und Experimente am GLUE Benchmark zeigen, dass unsere Methode die führenden Konkurrenten bei verschiedenen Aufgaben übertrifft.', 'id': 'Kebijaksanaan konvensional dalam pemotongan model bahasa berdasarkan Transformer adalah bahwa pemotongan mengurangi ekspresivitas model dan oleh itu lebih mungkin untuk tidak cocok daripada terlalu cocok. Namun, di bawah paradigm a pretrain-and-finetune yang trending, kita berpostulasi hipotesis anti-tradisional, yaitu: pruning meningkatkan resiko overfitting ketika dilakukan pada fase fine-tuning. Dalam kertas ini, kami bermaksud untuk mengatasi masalah overfitting dan meningkatkan prestasi pruning melalui pengetahuan progresif destilasi dengan properti terikat kesalahan. Kami menunjukkan untuk pertama kalinya bahwa mengurangi resiko overfitting dapat membantu efektif pemotongan di bawah paradigma pretrain-and-finetune. Studi Ablasi dan eksperimen pada benchmark GLUE menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi kompetitor yang memimpin melalui tugas yang berbeda.', 'fa': 'دانش معمولی در برداشتن مدل زبانی که بر اساس تغییر\u200cدهنده بنیاد دارد این است که برداشتن مدل را کاهش می\u200cدهد و به این دلیل احتمال بیشتری برای برداشتن به جای برخورداری است. با این حال، زیر پارادیگ پیشرین و فین\u200cتون، یک فرضیه مخالف سنتی را تغییر می\u200cدهیم، یعنی: برداشتن خطر تغییر تغییر تغییر می\u200cافزاید زمانی که در مراحل تغییر تغییر\u200cسازی انجام می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما هدف داریم که مشکل زیادی را حل کنیم و عملکرد زیادی را از طریق جدایی دانش پیشرفته با ویژه های اشتباهی به دست برداریم. ما برای اولین بار نشان می دهیم که خطر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر را کاهش می دهیم، می تواند به فعالیت تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر دهد. مطالعه\u200cها و آزمایش\u200cها روی صندوق GLUE نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما مسابقات رقابت\u200cکننده\u200cهای رقابت\u200cکننده\u200cهای پیشینیان را در کار مختلف انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '트림은 Transformer의 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 전통적인 관점에서 트림은 모델의 표현 능력을 떨어뜨리기 때문에 지나치게 일치하지 않을 수도 있다.그러나 전통적인 추세 조정 가설에서 과도한 조정이 이루어지면 위험이 증가한다.본고에서 우리의 목표는 과도한 의합 문제를 해결하고 오차계 성격을 가진 점진적인 지식 추출을 통해 가지치기 성능을 향상시키는 것이다.pretrain과finetune 모델에서 과도한 의합 위험을 낮추는 것이 편집의 유효성을 높이는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 처음으로 증명했다.GLUE 기준에 대한 소식 연구와 실험에 따르면 우리의 방법은 서로 다른 임무에서 선두적인 경쟁자보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Hikima ya kawaida katika kuelezea mifano ya lugha ya zamani ni kwamba uchunguzi unapunguza mtazamo wa mitindo na hivyo inawezekana kuwa na uwezekano wa kufanya kazi badala ya kuingia. Hata hivyo, chini ya unyanyapaa wa matumizi ya mvua na kifinetu, tunaweka nadharia ya upinzani wa kitamaduni, ambayo ni: kuelewa kuongeza hatari ya kupungua wakati uliofanyika katika hatua ya vizuri. Katika karatasi hii, tunakusudia kukabiliana na tatizo hili linaloendelea na kuboresha utendaji wa uelewa kupitia utofauti wa maarifa ya kuendelea kwa utaalam wa makosa. Tunaonyesha kwa mara ya kwanza kwamba kupunguza hatari ya uvamizi kunaweza kusaidia ufanisi wa kuelewa chini ya unyanyasaji wa mvua na kifinetu. Utafiti na majaribio kwenye bendera ya GLUE unaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inatoa watawala wakuu katika kazi mbalimbali.', 'tr': 'Transformer dil nusgalarynda adalatly bilgelik görkezilişi nusgalary üçin çykarylyk nusgalaryny azaltýar we şonuň ýagdaýynyň ýerine ýetişmegi köp bolup biler. Ancak, önümüzdeki pretrain-and-finetun paradigmanın altında, ters geleneksel bir tahmin edilmesi gerekirse, bu durum: toplamak için yüksek eşleşme şansını arttır. Bu kagyzda, biz iň gowy ýagdaý meseläni çözmek we ýuwaşlyk etmäge göz öňünde ýüze bilgi taýýarlanmasy bilen hata taýýarlanmasy bilen hedef edýäris. İlk defa, yüksek uygulama riskini azaltmak için pretrain ve finetun paradigmanın altında tetikleme etkinliğine yardım edebileceğini gösteriyoruz. GLUE benchmarkynda uklanjak öwrenmeleri we deneyler biziň ýüzümizde başga çykyşlaryň üstüne çykýandygyny görkez.', 'sq': 'Mëdija konvencionale në shfrytëzimin e modeleve gjuhësore me bazë në Transformer është se shfrytëzimi redukton ekspresivitetin e modelit dhe kështu ka më shumë gjasa të pakësohet sesa të teprojë. Megjithatë, nën paradigm ën e prirjes së paraardhjes së paraardhjes dhe të hollësisë, postulojmë një hipotezë kundërtradicionale, që është: rrënimi rrit rrezikun e mbipajtimit kur kryehet në fazën e rregullimit të hollësisë. Në këtë letër, ne synojmë të trajtojmë problemin e mbipajtimit dhe të përmirësojmë shfrytëzimin nëpërmjet distillacionit progressiv të njohurive me prona të lidhura me gabime. Ne tregojmë për herë të parë se zvogëlimi i rrezikut të mbipajtimit mund të ndihmojë efektshmërinë e pjekurisë nën paradigm ën e paraujit dhe të hollësisë. Studimet e aftësisë dhe eksperimentet në standartin GLUE tregojnë se metoda jonë mbizotëron konkurentët kryesorë nëpërmjet detyrave të ndryshme.', 'am': 'የፊደል ቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎችን በማስተካከል የግል ጥበብ ምሳሌ የሞዴል መልዕክት ያጎድላል፡፡ ስለዚህም ከመስጠት ይልቅ ይሻላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ከዘለላዊ እና የፊንጤናዊ ግንኙነት በታች፣ በተቃዋሚ አካባቢ ጉዳይ፣ ማስተዋል በጥሩ ጉዳይ ላይ በተደረገ ጊዜ የውርደትን ጉዳት ያበዛል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የስህተት ታስሮ ባለው የስህተት ግንኙነትን በመግለጥ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያ ጊዜ የውጤት መከራን የሚያጎድል የፊንደነ እና የፊንቱና የፍላስቲን ፍላጎት ውጤት ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ በGLUE benchmark ላይ አፍላሊት ትምህርት እና ፈተናዎች ልዩ ስራቶች የሚኖሩትን አዋቂዎችን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Gewone wysheid in die pruning van Transformer-gebaseerde taal modele is dat pruning die model uitdrukking verklein en dus is meer waarskynlik om te ondersteun eerder as overfit. Maar onder die trending pretrain-en-finetune paradigme, het ons 'n counter-tradisionele hipotees postuleer, dit is: pruning verhoog die risiko van overfitting wanneer uitgevoer word by die fyn-tuning fase. In hierdie papier, ons doen doel om die oorgepassende probleem te adres en die pruning-prestasie te verbeter deur progresiewe kennis-destilasie met foutbind-eienskappe. Ons wys vir die eerste keer dat die risiko van overfitting verduur kan help die effektiviteit van pruning onder die pretrain-en-finetune paradigme. Ablation studies en eksperimente op die GLUE-benchmark wys dat ons metode die ledige mededingers oor verskillende taak uitvoer.", 'hy': "Հավանդական իմաստությունն է տրանֆորմային լեզվի մոդելների խզբզելիս այն է, որ խզբզելը նվազեցնում է մոդելի արտահայտությունը և այդպիսով ավելի հավանական է, որ այն անհարմար կլինի, քան չափահար: Այնուամենայնիվ, նախօրինակ և նրբագեղ պարադիգմայի տակ մենք ենթադրում ենք հակա-ավանդական հիպոթեզի, այսինքն' կրճատը բարձրացնում է գերահարմարվելու վտանգը, երբ կատարվում է նրբագելավորման ժամանակ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք լուծել գերահարմարեցման խնդիրը և բարելավել հաջողությունը խզբզելու միջոցով առաջընթացիկ գիտելիքների դիսլիլացիայի միջոցով սխալ կապված հատկություններով: Մենք առաջին անգամ ցույց ենք տալիս, որ գերապատրաստման վտանգի նվազեցնելը կարող է օգնել գերադառնալու և գերադառնալու պարադիգմայի ներկայացման արդյունավետությանը: Աբլացիայի ուսումնասիրությունները և փորձարկումները GLUE-ի հարաբերականի վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը գերազանցում է տարբեր խնդիրների առաջնորդներին:", 'bs': 'Konvencionalna mudrost obrijanja jezičkih modela na transformeru je da obrijanje smanjuje model izraziteljstvo i tako je vjerojatnije da će se ne uklapati umjesto preuklapa. Međutim, pod trending paradigmom pretrain-i-finetuna, postulavamo kontratradicionalnu hipotezu, to je: pružanje povećava rizik od prekopterećenja kada se provede na fazi isprave. U ovom papiru, mi ciljamo da riješimo problem koji odgovara i poboljšamo pružanje putem progresivne destilacije znanja sa svojstvima povezanim sa pogreškama. Po prvi put pokazujemo da smanjenje rizika od preuređenja može pomoći učinkovitosti pružanja pod paradigmom pretkiša i finetuna. Istraživanja i eksperimenti u skloništu GLUE pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi vodeće konkurente u različitim zadacima.', 'az': 'Transformer-tabanlı dil modellərini təmizləmək üçün müxtəlif hikmət modelləri təmizləmək modelləri təmizləndirir və buna görə də uyğunlaşdırmaq yerinə daha çox imkansızdır. Ancaq, pretrain-finetun paradigmanın altında, əlavə keçmiş bir hipotezi təbliğ edirik, bu da: tədriğ yaxınlıq fəzində işlədikdə çox yüksək fikirləşmək riskini artırar. Bu kağızda, biz çox uyğun problemi çəkmək və tədbirlik işlətməsini fəaliyyətli elm destilasyonu ilə xəta müvəffəqiyyəti ilə dəyişdirmək istəyirik. Biz ilk dəfə göstəririk ki, çoxluğun təhlükəsini azaltmaq üçün pretrain-finetune paradigmanın altında təhlükəsizlik etkinliğinə kömək edə bilər. GLUE benchmark üzərində fəaliyyət təcrübələri və təcrübələrimizin metodumuzun müxtəlif işlərdə ön müqayisədçilərin üstünü göstərir.', 'bn': 'ট্রান্সফ্রেন্স ভিত্তিক ভাষার মডেলের প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রজ্ঞা বুঝতে পারে তা হলো বুদ্ধিমান মডেলের প্রকৃতিকে কমিয়ে দেয় তবে ধারাবাহিকভাবে বৃষ্টি এবং ফিনিটুন প্যারাডিভিডিমের অধীনে আমরা একটি বিরোধী ঐতিহ্যবাহী হিসেবে পোস্ট করেছি, যা হচ্ছে: সুন্দর প্রতিষ্ঠানের সময়ে প এই কাগজটিতে আমরা উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছি এই অতিরিক্ত সমস্যার সাথে কথা বলতে এবং অগ্রগতি জ্ঞানের বৈচিত্র্যের মাধ্যমে অগ্রগতির বিচ্ছিন আমরা প্রথমবার দেখাচ্ছি যে পাহাড়ের ঝুঁকি কমিয়ে দেওয়া যায়, প্রথমবারের বৃষ্টি এবং ফিনিটুন প্যারাডিমের নীচে বুদ্ধির ক জিলিউই বেনম্যার্কে আব্লালেশন গবেষণা এবং পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন কাজের মধ্যে প্রধান প্রতিযোগী', 'ca': "La saviesa convencional en recollir models de llenguatge basats en Transformes és que recollir redueix l'expressivitat del model i, per tant, és més probable que no està adequat. Tot i així, sota la tendència del paradigm a pre-rain-and-finetune, postulem una hipòtesi contratradicional, és a dir: el pruning augmenta el risc de sobreefitament quan es fa a la fase de fine-tuning. En aquest article, busquem abordar el problema de l'overfitting i millorar el rendiment de pruning mitjançant distillació progresiva del coneixement amb propietats vinculades a errors. Ens demostram per primera vegada que reduir el risc de superajustament pot ajudar a l'eficacia de la pruning sota el paradigma de pré-pluja i finificació. Els estudis d'ablació i experiments sobre el criteri de referència GLUE mostren que el nostre mètode supera els competidors líders en diverses tasques.", 'cs': 'Konvenční moudrost při prořezávání jazykových modelů založených na Transformeru je, že prořezávání snižuje expresivitu modelu, a tudíž je pravděpodobnější, že se spíše než přeřezává. Nicméně podle trendujícího paradigmatu pretrain-a-finetune postulujeme protitradiční hypotézu, tj. prořezání zvyšuje riziko nadměrného přizpůsobení při provádění ve fázi jemného ladění. V tomto článku se snažíme řešit problém přesahování a zlepšit výkon střihu prostřednictvím progresivní znalostní destilace s chybově vázanými vlastnostmi. Poprvé ukazujeme, že snížení rizika nadměrného vybavení může pomoci efektivnímu prořezávání v rámci paradigmatu pretrain-and-finetune. Ablační studie a experimenty na GLUE benchmarku ukazují, že naše metoda překonává přední konkurenty v různých úkolech.', 'et': 'Transformeritel põhinevate keelemudelite pügamise tavapärane tarkus on see, et pügamine vähendab mudeli väljendusvõimet ja seega on tõenäolisem, et see ei sobi üle. Kuid trendieelse ja peenhäälestuse paradigma alusel postuleerime vastutraditsioonilise hüpoteesi, st: pügamine suurendab peenhäälestuse faasis ülepaneku riski. Käesolevas töös püüame lahendada ülepaigutamise probleemi ja parandada pügamise jõudlust progressiivse teadmistepõhise destilleerimise kaudu veaga seotud omadustega. Näitame esmakordselt, et ülepaigutamise riski vähendamine võib aidata tõhustada pügamist eelse ja peenestamise paradigma alusel. ABLAtsiooniuuringud ja GLUE võrdlusaluse katsed näitavad, et meie meetod on erinevates ülesannetes juhtivatest konkurentidest parem.', 'fi': 'Perinteinen viisaus muuntajapohjaisten kielimallien karsimisessa on, että karsiminen vähentää mallin ekspressiivisyyttä ja on siten todennäköisempää alimitoitusta kuin ylikuormitusta. Kuitenkin trendikkään pretrain-and-fine-tune-paradigman mukaisesti postuloimme vastaperinteisen hypoteesin, joka on: karsiminen lisää ylikuormituksen riskiä, kun se suoritetaan hienosäätövaiheessa. Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme käsittelemään ylikuormitusongelmaa ja parantamaan karsimistehoa progressiivisella tietotislauksella, jolla on virhesidonnaisia ominaisuuksia. Osoitamme ensimmäistä kertaa, että yliviivausriskin vähentäminen voi auttaa karsimisen tehokkuutta esikäsittely- ja hienosäätöparadigmassa. Ablaatiotutkimukset ja GLUE-benchmarkin kokeilut osoittavat, että menetelmämme suoriutuu johtavista kilpailijoista eri tehtävissä.', 'jv': 'sapa sing perbudhakan karo akeh transformer sampek model kuwi nggawe gerakan oleh dumadhi model kesempresan karo ngono kuwi dianggawe gerakan ora bisa ngono nggawe Nanging, mengko iso nggambar aparampun pregunting-lan-finietune, kita ngomong ngerasah panelusuran konter-Tradisyonal Nang pember iki, kita nganggep nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno iki bakal nggawe gerakan salang kanggo ngerasakno ning ngerasakno Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan nganggo kuwi nggawe aturan pangan iki, iso nglanggar nggawe barang hari mbut kuwi mau. Ndoleh-Ndoleh sing beraksi lan ijol-ijolan surat banjur nggawe bener nggawe bener', 'he': 'חוכמה קונבנציונלית בשפת מודלים מבוססים בטרנספורטר היא שטיפול מפחיד את מודל הביטוי ולכן סביר יותר להתאים במקום להתאים מדי. בכל אופן, תחת הפרדיגמה המתמודדת של המגשם והדקה, אנו משערים היפותזיה נגד המסורתית, כלומר: השקיעה מגבירה את הסיכון להתאים יתר כשנעשה בשלב ההדקה. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתכוונים להתמודד עם הבעיה המתאימת ומשתפר את ההפעלה של השקיעה באמצעות שיתוף ידע מתקדם עם תכונות קשורות לשגיאות. אנו מראים בפעם הראשונה שמפחית הסיכון להתאים יתר יכול לעזור לעובדה של השקיעה תחת הפרדיגמה של לפני-גשם ומעדינה. Ablation studies and experiments on the GLUE benchmark show that our method outperforms the leading competitors across different tasks.', 'ha': "Hikima na ɗabi'a a cikin jarraba misalin harshen Transformer-based ni'anar da hankalin yana ƙarantar da salon-ayuka na motsi, kuma yana kasancẽwa mafiya kwamfyuta ya ci mafiya kwamfyuta. A lokacin da ke ƙara da zafi-da-finyuta, za mu ƙayyade wani kinyuta mai motsi da kawaici, shi ne: cutarwa yana ƙara hatari ya yi surfi idan an yi da shi a cikin fasi mai kyau. Ga wannan takardan, Munã nufin mu yi addu'a ga matabbatar da aka samu kuma mu ƙara gyaran gyaranta game da rarraba zane ta wajen aiki da properties-da-go. Muna nũna wa kwanza na ƙaranci halin sama yana iya amfani da fassarar mutane a ƙaranci-da-fintune. Ana karatun Ablas da jarrabõ na GLUU za'a nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana ƙaranci masu kandidanci cikin aikin dabam-daban.", 'sk': 'Konvencionalna modrost pri obrezovanju jezikovnih modelov, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih, je, da obrezovanje zmanjšuje izraznost modela in zato je bolj verjetno, da se ne prilega preveč. Vendar pa v skladu s trendovsko paradigmo pretrain-and-fine-tune predpostavljamo kontradicionalno hipotezo, in sicer: obrezovanje povečuje tveganje prekomernega prilagajanja, kadar se izvaja v fazi fine-tune. V tem prispevku želimo obravnavati problem prekomernega nameščanja in izboljšati zmogljivost obrezovanja prek progresivne destilacije znanja z lastnostmi, vezanimi na napake. Prvič pokažemo, da lahko zmanjšanje tveganja preoblačevanja pomaga pri učinkovitosti obrezovanja v skladu s paradigmo predprave in fine-tune. Ablacijske študije in eksperimenti glede referenčne vrednosti GLUE kažejo, da naša metoda presega vodilne konkurente pri različnih nalogah.', 'bo': 'Conventional wisdom in pruning Transformer-based language models is that pruning reduces the model expressiveness and thus is more likely to underfit than overfit. ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་འོངས་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་ལྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་འཕེལ་བ་སྐྱེ ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་མཁན་གྱི་ཉེན་ཁ་ཐོག་དང་ཕྱེད་པ་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཐོག་མའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དམངས་བའི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ། ལྕོག་ཅན་གྱི་བརྩལ་ཞིབ་དང་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཚད་GLUE བཀོད་རྟགས་བཀོད་པ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་གནད་སྡུད་པའི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་'}
{'en': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'CipherDAug: زيادة البيانات القائمة على النص المشفر لترجمة الآلة العصبية', 'pt': 'CipherDAug: aumento de dados baseado em texto cifrado para tradução automática neural', 'fr': 'CipherdAug\xa0: Augmentation de données basée sur le texte chiffré pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'es': 'CipherDaug: aumento de datos basado en texto cifrado para la traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': 'CipherDug ：神経機械翻訳のための暗号文ベースのデータ拡張', 'hi': 'CipherDAug: सिफरटेक्स्ट आधारित न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए डेटा संवर्धन', 'zh': 'CipherDAug曰:神经机器翻译者,密文之数也', 'ru': 'CipherDAug: Расширение данных на основе шифротекста для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'CipherDAug: Méadú Sonraí bunaithe ar Ciphertext le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext alapú adatbővítés idegi gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση δεδομένων βασισμένη σε κρυπτογραφημένο κείμενο για νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'kk': 'ШифрDAug: Шифрланған мәтін негіздеген деректерді аудару үшін көтеру', 'it': 'CipherDAug: Aumento dei dati basato su Ciphertext per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'mk': 'CipherDAug: Агментација на податоците базирани на Ciphertext за преведување на неврални машини', 'lt': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext based Data Augmentation for Neural Machine Translation', 'ms': 'CipherDAug: Pengembangan Data berasaskan Ciphertext untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'ml': 'സിഫര്\u200dഡായുഗ്: നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ ഓഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'CipherDAug: Aġġustament tad-Dejta bbażata fuq iċ-ċifrotekst għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'mn': 'CipherDAug: Шифр-текст суурилсан мэдээлэл сэтгэл машины хөгжүүлэлтийн нэмэгдүүлэлт', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'CipherDAug: Augmentarea datelor bazate pe Ciphertext pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'sr': 'CipherDAug: Uzgođenje podataka na osnovu šifra za neuronski prevod mašine', 'pl': 'CipherDAug: Rozszerzenie danych oparte na szyfrowaniu dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'si': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext-based Data Agmentation for neural machine translation', 'so': 'CipherDAug: Tilmaamaha macluumaadka ee ku saleysan Ciphertext', 'sv': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext baserad dataökning för neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext based Data Augmentation for Neural Machine Translation', 'ur': 'سیفر ڈاگ: سیفر ٹیکسٹ بنیادی ڈاٹ اگنٹمنٹ نیورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے', 'uz': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext based Data Augmentation for Neural Machine Translation', 'vi': 'Mật mã: Sự gia tăng dữ liệu dựa vào các máy móc thần kinh', 'nl': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext gebaseerde gegevensuitbreiding voor neuronale machinevertaling', 'bg': 'CipherDAug: Цифрово базирано увеличаване на данни за неврален машинен превод', 'da': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext baseret dataudvidelse til neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'CipherDAug: Povećanje podataka na osnovu šifra za neuronski prevod stroja', 'de': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext basierte Datenerweiterung für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'ko': 'CipherDAug: 신경 기계 번역에 사용되는 암호 기반 데이터 강화', 'id': 'CipherDAug: Agmentasi Data Berdasarkan Ciphertext untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'CipherDAug: Utafiti wa Data kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'tr': 'Şifreler', 'sq': 'CipherDAug: Rritja e të dhënave bazuar në Ciphertext për Translation Neural Machine', 'af': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext based Data Augmentation for Neural Machine Translation', 'am': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext based Data Augmentation for Neural Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext-based Data Augmentation for Neural Machine Translation', 'bn': 'সিফার DAug: নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য সিফারেটেক্সট ভিত্তিক ডাটা অ্যাগমেন্টেশন', 'ca': 'CipherDAug: Aumentació de dades basada en cifresper a la traducció de màquines neurals', 'et': 'CipherDAug: Ciphertext based Data Augmentation for Neural Machine Translation', 'bs': 'CipherDAug: Povećanje podataka na osnovu šifra za neuronski prevod mašine', 'cs': 'CipherDAug: Rozšíření dat založené na šifrovacím textu pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'fi': 'CipherDAug: Salakirjoituspohjainen datan lisäys hermokonekäännökseen', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'CipherDAug: Povečanje podatkov na podlagi šifratnega besedila za strojno prevajanje nevronov', 'he': 'סיפרDAug: גידול נתונים מבוסס על סיפרטקסט לתרגום מכונת נוירולית', 'bo': 'གསང་བ་DAug: གསང་བ་ཡིག་གི་རྨས་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སྒེར་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་སྤྱོད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ'}
{'en': 'Machine reading comprehension is a heavily-studied research and test field for evaluating new pre-trained language models (PrLMs) and fine-tuning strategies, and recent studies have enriched the pre-trained language models with syntactic, semantic and other linguistic information to improve the performance of the models. In this paper, we imitate the human reading process in connecting the anaphoric expressions and explicitly leverage the coreference information of the entities to enhance the word embeddings from the pre-trained language model, in order to highlight the coreference mentions of the entities that must be identified for coreference-intensive question answering in QUOREF, a relatively new dataset that is specifically designed to evaluate the coreference-related performance of a model. We use two strategies to fine-tune a pre-trained language model, namely, placing an additional encoder layer after a pre-trained language model to focus on the coreference mentions or constructing a relational graph convolutional network to model the coreference relations. We demonstrate that the explicit incorporation of coreference information in the fine-tuning stage performs better than the incorporation of the coreference information in pre-training a language model.', 'ar': 'نقترح تقنية جديدة لزيادة البيانات للترجمة الآلية العصبية بناءً على نصوص التشفير ROT- $ k $. ROT- $ k $ عبارة عن تشفير بسيط لاستبدال الحروف يستبدل حرفًا في نص عادي بالحرف $ k $ th بعده في الأبجدية. نقوم أولاً بإنشاء عدة نصوص مشفرة ROT- $ k $ باستخدام قيم مختلفة من $ k $ للنص العادي وهو جانب المصدر من البيانات المتوازية. ثم نستفيد من بيانات التدريب المشفرة هذه إلى جانب البيانات المتوازية الأصلية عبر تدريب متعدد المصادر لتحسين الترجمة الآلية العصبية. تستخدم طريقتنا ، CipherDAug ، إجراء تدريب مستوحى من التنظيم المشترك ، ولا تتطلب مصادر بيانات خارجية بخلاف بيانات التدريب الأصلية ، وتستخدم محولًا قياسيًا لتتفوق على تقنيات زيادة البيانات القوية في العديد من مجموعات البيانات بهامش كبير. تتحد هذه التقنية بسهولة مع الأساليب الحالية لزيادة البيانات ، وتنتج نتائج قوية بشكل خاص في الإعدادات منخفضة الموارد.', 'es': 'Proponemos una novedosa técnica de aumento de datos para la traducción automática neuronal basada en textos cifrados Rot-$K$. rot-$k$ es un cifrado de sustitución de letras simple que reemplaza una letra en el texto sin formato por la letra $k$ésima después de ella en el alfabeto. Primero generamos varios textos cifrados Rot-$k$ usando diferentes valores de $k$ para el texto sin formato que es el lado de origen de los datos paralelos. Luego, aprovechamos estos datos de entrenamiento cifrados junto con los datos paralelos originales a través del entrenamiento de múltiples fuentes para mejorar la traducción automática neuronal. Nuestro método, CipherdAug, utiliza un procedimiento de entrenamiento inspirado en la corregularización, no requiere fuentes de datos externas más que los datos de entrenamiento originales y utiliza un Transformer estándar para superar las técnicas de aumento de datos sólidas en varios conjuntos de datos por un margen significativo. Esta técnica se combina fácilmente con los enfoques existentes para el aumento de datos y produce resultados particularmente sólidos en entornos de bajos recursos.', 'fr': "Nous proposons une nouvelle technique d'augmentation de données pour la traduction automatique neuronale basée sur des textes chiffrés ROT-$k$. Rot-$k$ est un chiffrement par substitution de lettres simple qui remplace une lettre dans le texte brut par la lettre $k$ème qui la suit dans l'alphabet. Nous générons d'abord plusieurs textes chiffrés ROT-$k$ en utilisant différentes valeurs de $k$ pour le texte en clair qui est le côté source des données parallèles. Nous exploitons ensuite ces données d'entraînement chiffrées ainsi que les données parallèles d'origine via un entraînement multisource pour améliorer la traduction automatique neuronale. Notre méthode, CipherdAug, utilise une procédure de formation inspirée de la corégulation, ne nécessite aucune source de données externe autre que les données d'entraînement d'origine et utilise un transformateur standard pour surpasser les techniques d'augmentation de données solides sur plusieurs ensembles de données de manière significative. Cette technique se combine facilement avec les approches existantes de l'augmentation des données, et donne des résultats particulièrement intéressants dans les environnements à faibles ressources.", 'pt': 'Propomos uma nova técnica de aumento de dados para tradução automática neural baseada em textos cifrados ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ é uma cifra de substituição de letras simples que substitui uma letra no texto simples pela $k$th letra depois dela no alfabeto. Primeiro, geramos vários textos cifrados ROT-$k$ usando diferentes valores de $k$ para o texto simples, que é o lado da fonte dos dados paralelos. Em seguida, aproveitamos esses dados de treinamento criptografados junto com os dados paralelos originais por meio de treinamento de várias fontes para melhorar a tradução de máquina neural. Nosso método, CipherDAug, usa um procedimento de treinamento inspirado em co-regularização, não requer fontes de dados externas além dos dados de treinamento originais e usa um Transformer padrão para superar técnicas de aumento de dados fortes em vários conjuntos de dados por uma margem significativa. Essa técnica combina facilmente com as abordagens existentes de aumento de dados e produz resultados particularmente fortes em ambientes com poucos recursos.', 'ja': '私たちは、ROT -$ k $暗号文に基づいた神経機械翻訳のための新しいデータ拡張技術を提案します。ROT -$ k $は単純な文字置換暗号で、平文の文字をアルファベットの$ k $文字に置き換えます。まず、並列データのソース側である平文の異なる$ k $の値を使用して、複数のROT -$ k $暗号文を生成します。そして、この暗号化されたトレーニングデータを、マルチソーストレーニングを介して元の並列データとともに活用して、ニューラル機械翻訳を改善します。当社の方法であるCipherDAugは、共規則化にインスパイアされたトレーニング手順を使用し、元のトレーニングデータ以外の外部データソースを必要とせず、標準のTransformerを使用して、いくつかのデータセットで強力なデータ拡張技術を大幅にマージンで上回ります。この手法は、データ拡張に対する既存のアプローチと容易に組み合わせることができ、リソースの少ない環境では特に強力な結果をもたらします。', 'zh': '立ROT-$k$密文者神经机器翻译数增其术。 ROT-$k$ 易字母密码,易字母表第 $k$th 字母。 先用$k$者值为明文(并行数源端)生数 ROT-$k$ 密文。 然后因多源以教之加密数及原始并行数以改神经机器翻译。 吾法CipherDAug用受共正则化之所发,自始数之外不须外数据源,而用格Transformer于数集上显优于强数。 其术可轻与见数合,而资源匮乏之境特强也。', 'ru': 'Предложена новая методика увеличения данных для нейронного машинного перевода на основе ROT-$ k$ шифротекстов. ROT-$ k$ - это простой шифр подстановки букв, который заменяет букву в открытом тексте на $ k$ -ю букву после нее в алфавите. Сначала мы генерируем несколько ROT-$ k$ шифротекстов, используя различные значения $ k$ для открытого текста, который является исходной стороной параллельных данных. Затем мы используем эти зашифрованные обучающие данные вместе с исходными параллельными данными посредством обучения из нескольких источников для улучшения нейронного машинного перевода. Наш метод, CipherDAug, использует процедуру обучения, основанную на сорегуляризации, не требует внешних источников данных, кроме исходных данных обучения, и использует стандартный Трансформер, чтобы превзойти сильные методы увеличения данных на нескольких наборах данных со значительным запасом. Этот метод легко сочетается с существующими подходами к увеличению объема данных и дает особенно сильные результаты в условиях ограниченности ресурсов.', 'hi': 'हम आरओटी-$k $ सिफरटेक्स्ट के आधार पर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक उपन्यास डेटा-संवर्धन तकनीक का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। ROT-$k$ एक साधारण अक्षर प्रतिस्थापन सिफर है जो सादे पाठ में एक अक्षर को वर्णमाला में इसके बाद $k $ वें अक्षर के साथ बदल देता है। हम पहले सादे पाठ के लिए $k $ के विभिन्न मूल्यों का उपयोग करके कई ROT-$k $ सिफरटेक्स्ट उत्पन्न करते हैं जो समानांतर डेटा का स्रोत पक्ष है। फिर हम तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में सुधार करने के लिए बहु-स्रोत प्रशिक्षण के माध्यम से मूल समानांतर डेटा के साथ-साथ इस enciphered प्रशिक्षण डेटा का लाभ उठाते हैं। हमारी विधि, CipherDAug, एक सह-नियमितीकरण-प्रेरित प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया का उपयोग करती है, मूल प्रशिक्षण डेटा के अलावा किसी भी बाहरी डेटा स्रोतों की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है, और एक महत्वपूर्ण मार्जिन से कई डेटासेट पर मजबूत डेटा वृद्धि तकनीकों को पछाड़ने के लिए एक मानक ट्रांसफॉर्मर का उपयोग करती है। यह तकनीक डेटा वृद्धि के लिए मौजूदा दृष्टिकोणों के साथ आसानी से जोड़ती है, और कम-संसाधन सेटिंग्स में विशेष रूप से मजबूत परिणाम देती है।', 'ga': 'Molaimid teicníocht mhéadaithe sonraí nua d’aistriúchán meaisín néarach bunaithe ar théacsanna ROT-$k$. Is éard atá i ROT-$k$ ná cipher ionadú litreach simplí a chuireann an litir $k$ú ina dhiaidh san aibítir in ionad litir sa ghnáththéacs. Ginimid ar dtús téacsanna iolracha ROT-$k$ ag baint úsáide as luachanna difriúla $k$ don ghnáththéacs arb é an taobh foinse de na sonraí comhthreomhara é. Déanaimid giaráil ansin ar na sonraí oiliúna enciphered seo mar aon leis na sonraí comhthreomhar bunaidh trí oiliúint ilfhoinse chun feabhas a chur ar an meaisín-aistriúchán néarach. Úsáideann ár modh, CipherDAug, nós imeachta oiliúna atá spreagtha ag an gcomhrialachán, ní éilíonn sé aon fhoinsí seachtracha sonraí seachas na bunshonraí oiliúna, agus úsáideann Trasfhoirmeoir caighdeánach chun sár-obair a dhéanamh ar theicníochtaí láidre méadaithe sonraí ar roinnt tacar sonraí. Comhcheanglaíonn an teicníocht seo go héasca leis na cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana féin maidir le méadú sonraí, agus bíonn torthaí an-láidir ar fáil i suíomhanna íseal-acmhainne.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ პრომენტის მონაცემების მექნიკური ტექნოგია ნეიროლური მაქინის გაგრძელებისთვის ROT-$k$ სიფერტექსტზე. ROT-$k$ არის უბრალო სიტყვას შეცვლის სიტყვა, რომელიც სიტყვას გადაცვლა სიტყვა სიტყვაში, რომელიც სიტყვას სიტყვა სიტყვას $k$th სიტყვა, რომელიც შეცვლა სიტყვა ალ ჩვენ პირველად მრავალ ROT-$k$ სიფერტექსტის გამოყენება განსხვავებული მნიშვნელობების გამოყენება $k$ მნიშვნელობების გარეშე, რომელიც პარალელი მონაცემების მხოლოდ მ შემდეგ ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ ეს ინფრიქტრებული განაცემის მონაცემები და ორიგინალური პარალელური მონაცემების გამოყენება მრავალური განაცემის გამოყენებაში, რომ გა ჩვენი მეთოდი, CipherDAug, გამოყენება კონრეგრალიზაციის განვითარება პროცესტის გამოყენება, არაფერი მონაცემების მსოფლიოდ გამოყენება და სტანდარტრუქტრების გამოყენება ძალიან მონაცემების აგგენ ეს ტექნექტიკა მარტივი გადაყენება მონაცემების აღდომენტაციას და ძალიან ძალიან შედეგება მარტივი რესურსების პარამეტრებში.', 'hu': 'Egy új adatok-nagyobbítási technikát javasolunk az idegi gépi fordításhoz ROT-$k$ rejtjelszövegek alapján. ROT-$k$ egy egyszerű betűhelyettesítő titkosítás, amely egy egyszerű szövegben lévő betűt helyettesít az ábécében lévő $k$th betűvel. Először több ROT-$k$ titkosítási szöveget generálunk különböző $k$ értékekkel a párhuzamos adatok forrási oldalát képező egyszerű szöveghez. Ezt követően ezeket a titkosított képzési adatokat és az eredeti párhuzamos adatokat többforrásból álló képzésen keresztül használjuk fel az idegi gépi fordítás javítása érdekében. Módszerünk, a CipherDAug, egy co-regularizáció ihletésű képzési eljárást alkalmaz, nem igényel külső adatforrásokat az eredeti képzési adatokon kívül, és egy szabványos Transformert használ arra, hogy jelentős mértékben felülmúlja az erős adatok nagyobbítási technikáit több adatkészleten. Ez a technika könnyen összekapcsolódik az adatok nagyobbítására vonatkozó meglévő megközelítésekkel, és különösen erős eredményeket eredményez alacsony erőforrásokkal rendelkező beállítások esetén.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε μια νέα τεχνική αύξησης δεδομένων για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση βασισμένη σε κρυπτογραφημένα κείμενα. Το ROT-$k$ είναι ένας απλός κώδικας υποκατάστασης γραμμάτων που αντικαθιστά ένα γράμμα στο απλό κείμενο με το $k$th γράμμα μετά από αυτό στο αλφάβητο. Αρχικά δημιουργούμε πολλαπλά κείμενα κρυπτογράφησης χρησιμοποιώντας διαφορετικές τιμές $k$ για το απλό κείμενο που είναι η πλευρά προέλευσης των παράλληλων δεδομένων. Στη συνέχεια, αξιοποιούμε αυτά τα κρυπτογραφημένα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης μαζί με τα αρχικά παράλληλα δεδομένα μέσω εκπαίδευσης πολλαπλών πηγών για να βελτιώσουμε τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση. Η μέθοδος μας, χρησιμοποιεί μια διαδικασία κατάρτισης εμπνευσμένη από τη συγχρηματοποίηση, δεν απαιτεί εξωτερικές πηγές δεδομένων εκτός από τα αρχικά δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης και χρησιμοποιεί έναν τυποποιημένο μετασχηματιστή για να ξεπεράσει τις τεχνικές ισχυρής αύξησης δεδομένων σε πολλά σύνολα δεδομένων με σημαντικό περιθώριο. Αυτή η τεχνική συνδυάζεται εύκολα με τις υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις για την αύξηση των δεδομένων, και παράγει ιδιαίτερα ισχυρά αποτελέσματα σε ρυθμίσεις χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους.', 'it': "Proponiamo una nuova tecnica di aumento dei dati per la traduzione automatica neurale basata su testi cifrati ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ è un semplice cifrario di sostituzione delle lettere che sostituisce una lettera nel testo chiaro con la lettera $k$a dopo di essa nell'alfabeto. Per prima cosa generiamo più testi cifrati ROT-$k$ usando diversi valori di $k$ per il testo in chiaro che è il lato sorgente dei dati paralleli. Quindi sfruttiamo questi dati di allenamento cifrati insieme ai dati paralleli originali tramite formazione multi-source per migliorare la traduzione automatica neurale. Il nostro metodo, CipherDAug, utilizza una procedura di formazione ispirata alla co-regolarizzazione, non richiede fonti di dati esterne diverse dai dati di allenamento originali e utilizza un Transformer standard per superare con un margine significativo le forti tecniche di aumento dei dati su diversi set di dati. Questa tecnica si combina facilmente con gli approcci esistenti all'aumento dei dati e produce risultati particolarmente forti in impostazioni a basso contenuto di risorse.", 'lt': 'Siūlome naują duomenų didinimo metodą nervinių mašinų vertimui, pagrįstą ROT-$k$ šifrais. ROT-$k$ yra paprastas raidės pakeitimo kodas, kuris pakeičia raidę tiesiojoje tekste $k$th raide po jos raidėje. Pirmiausia sukuriame kelis ROT-$k$ šifravimo tekstus naudojant skirtingas $k$ vertes paprastam tekstui, kuris yra lygiagrečių duomenų šaltinis. Tuomet naudosime šiuos užfiksuotus mokymo duomenis ir originalius lygiagrečius duomenis daugialypiu mokymu siekiant pagerinti nervinių mašinų vertimą. Mūsų metodas, CipherDAug, naudoja koregularizacija pagrįstą mokymo procedūrą, nereikalauja jokių išorinių duomenų šaltinių, išskyrus pradinius mokymo duomenis, ir naudoja standartinį Transformer į, kad daugelio duomenų rinkinių duomenys būtų stipriai padidinti. Šis metodas lengvai derinamas su esamais metodais didinti duomenis, o mažai išteklių gauna ypač didelių rezultatų.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме нова техника за зголемување на податоците за превод на неврални машини базирана на шифрирани тексти на ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ е едноставен шифр за замена на букви кој го замени буквото во текстот со буквата $k$th после тоа во алфабитата. Прво генерираме неколку ROT-$k$ шифрирани тексти користејќи различни вредности од $k$ за рамниот текст кој е извор на паралелните податоци. Потоа ги искористуваме овие заобиколени податоци за обука заедно со оригиналните паралелни податоци преку мултиизворни обуки за подобрување на преведувањето на невралните машини. Нашиот метод, Сифердауг, користи процедура на обука инспирирана на корегуларизација, не бара надворешни извори на податоци освен оригиналните податоци за обука, и користи стандарден Трансформер за да ги надмине силните техники за зголемување на податоците на неколку податоци со значите Оваа техника лесно се комбинира со постојните пристапи кон зголемувањето на податоците и дава особено силни резултати во поставувањата со ниски ресурси.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan teknik peningkatan data baru untuk terjemahan mesin saraf berdasarkan sifer ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ adalah sifer penggantian huruf sederhana yang menggantikan huruf dalam teks ringkas dengan huruf $k$th selepas ia dalam alfabet. Kami pertama-tama menghasilkan ciphertext ROT-$k$ berbilang menggunakan nilai berbeza $k$ untuk teks ringkas yang merupakan sisi sumber data selari. Kemudian, kita menggunakan data latihan ini bersama dengan data paralel asal melalui latihan berbilang-sumber untuk meningkatkan terjemahan mesin saraf. Kaedah kami, CipherDAug, menggunakan prosedur latihan yang diinspirasi oleh koregularisasi, tidak memerlukan sumber data luaran selain data latihan asal, dan menggunakan Transformer piawai untuk melebihi teknik peningkatan data yang kuat pada beberapa set data dengan margin yang signifikan. Teknik ini bergabung dengan mudah dengan pendekatan yang ada untuk peningkatan data, dan memberikan keputusan yang sangat kuat dalam tetapan sumber rendah.', 'kk': 'Біз ROT-$k$ шифр текстеріне негізделген невралдық машинаның аудармасының романдық деректерді жүктеу техникасын ұсынамыз. ROT -$k$ әріптерді алмастыру шифры, әдімгінде әріпті $k$th әріптен алмастырады. Біз біріншіден бірнеше ROT-$k$ шифрлау мәндерін параллель деректердің көзі бойынша $k$ мәндерінің түрлі мәндерін қолданып құрамыз. Содан кейін, невралдық компьютерді аудару үшін бірнеше көзі бақылау арқылы бастапқы параллелі деректермен бірге қолданып тұрмыз. Біздің тәсіліміз, CipherDAug, бірнеше деректер жинақтарында күшті деректерді өзгерту технологияларын бірнеше деректерді өзгерту үшін бағытты деректер көзінің басқа деректер көзі керек болмайды. Бұл техника деректерді көбейту арқылы оңай біріктіреді және өте құнды нәтижелерді төмен ресурстар баптауларына береді.', 'ml': 'We propose a novel data-augmentation technique for neural machine translation based on ROT-$k$ ciphertexts.  ROT-$k ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ എഴുത്ത് പകര്\u200dത്തുന്ന സിഫര്\u200d ആണ്. അത് വെളുത്ത ടെക്സ്റ്റില്\u200d ഒരു കത്ത് പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. അത് ആല്\u200dഫാബെറ്റില്\u200d കിട നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരുപാട് റോട്ട്-$k സിഫര്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്തമായ $k$ വില മൂല്ല്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പ പിന്നീട് ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള പല-സ്രോതസ്സ് പരിശീലനത്തിലൂടെ ഈ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d, സിഫര്\u200dഡായുഗ്, ഒരു സഹനിയന്ത്രണത്തില്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന പരിശീലന പ്രക്രിയയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, പുറത്തുള്ള ഡാറ്റാ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ല, പ്രധാന ഈ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് എളുപ്പമായി സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്നു. പ', 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu teknika ġdida ta' żieda fid-dejta għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali bbażata fuq iċ-ċifri ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ huwa ċifra sempliċi ta’ sostituzzjoni ta’ ittri li tissostitwixxi ittra fit-test qarrieqi bl-ittra $k$th wara fl-alfabet. L-ewwel niġġeneraw diversi kodiċi ROT-$k$ bl-użu ta’ valuri differenti ta’ $k$ għat-test ċar li huwa n-naħa tas-sors tad-dejta parallela. Imbagħad nagħmlu użu minn din id-dejta ta’ taħriġ imqarrba flimkien mad-dejta parallela oriġinali permezz ta’ taħriġ b’diversi sorsi biex itejbu t-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. Il-metodu tagħna, CipherDAug, juża proċedura ta’ taħriġ ispirata mill-koregolarizzazzjoni, ma jeħtieġ l-ebda sors ta’ dejta esterna għajr id-dejta oriġinali tat-taħriġ, u juża Transformer standard biex iwettaq tekniki qawwija ta’ żieda tad-dejta fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta b’marġini sinifikanti. Din it-teknika tgħaqqad faċilment ma’ approċċi eżistenti għal żieda fid-dejta, u tagħti riżultati partikolarment b’saħħithom f’ambjenti b’riżorsi baxxi.", 'no': 'Vi foreslår ein novel dataaugmentasjonstekk for neuralmaskinsomsetjing basert på ROT-$k$ krypteringstekstar. ROT -$k$ er ein enkel bokstaverstattskrift som byter ut ein bokstav i teksten med bokstaven $k$th etter det i alfabetet. Vi lagar først fleire ROT-$k$ krypteringstekstar med ulike verdiar av $k$ for det vanlege teksten som er kjeldesiden av parallelle data. Vi leverer så denne enkripte øvingsdata saman med originale parallelle data via fleire kjeldeopplæring for å forbetra omsetjing av neuralmaskin. Metoden vårt, CipherDAug, bruker ein co-regularisert opplæringsprosedyr, krev ingen eksterne datakilder enn originale opplæringsdata, og bruker ein standard transformer for å utføra sterke dataaugmentasjonsteknologikar på fleire datasett med ein signifikant margin. Denne teknikken kombinerer lett med eksisterande tilnærmingar til økning av data, og gjer spesielt sterke resultat i låg ressursinnstillingar.', 'mn': 'Бид ROT-$k$ шифр текстүүдийн үндсэн мэдээллийн нэмэлт технологийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. ROT-$k$ гэдэг нь энгийн захиа орлуулах шифр юм. Энэ нь ерөнхий текстэй захиа нь алфавит дээр $k$th захиа орлуулдаг. Эхлээд бид параллель өгөгдлийн эх үүсвэр талыг ашиглан олон ROT-$k$ шифрийн текст бий болгодог. Дараа нь бид үүнийг ойролцоогоор дасгал өгөгдлийг мэдрэлийн дасгал хөгжүүлэхийн тулд олон эх үүсвэрийн дасгал хөгжүүлэх боломжтой болгодог. Бидний арга, CipherDAug, нийгмийн урам зориулах боломжтой суралцах процедурыг ашиглаж, эхний суралцах өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс өөр гадаад мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрийг хэрэглэдэггүй, мөн стандарт Трансформатчийг ашиглаж өгөгдлийн нэмэлт технологийг оло Энэ техник өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэх арга барилгуудтай амархан холбогдож, ялангуяа бага нөөцийн төвшинд хүчтэй үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy nową technikę powiększania danych do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego opartego na szyfrowanych tekstach ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ to prosty szyfr zastępujący literę, który zastępuje literę w tekście zwykłym $k$th literą po niej w alfabecie. Najpierw generujemy wiele tekstów szyfru ROT-$k$ używając różnych wartości $k$ dla tekstu zwykłego, który jest stroną źródłową danych równoległych. Następnie wykorzystujemy te zaszyfrowane dane treningowe wraz z oryginalnymi danymi równoległymi poprzez szkolenie wielu źródeł, aby poprawić tłumaczenie maszynowe neuronowe. Nasza metoda, CipherDAug, wykorzystuje procedurę szkoleniową inspirowaną współregularyzacją, nie wymaga żadnych zewnętrznych źródeł danych poza oryginalnymi danymi treningowymi i wykorzystuje standardowy Transformer, aby przewyższyć techniki silnego powiększania danych na kilku zbiorach danych o znaczny margines. Technika ta łatwo łączy się z istniejącymi podejściami do powiększania danych i daje szczególnie silne wyniki w warunkach niskiej ilości zasobów.', 'ro': 'Propunem o tehnică nouă de augmentare a datelor pentru traducerea automată neurală bazată pe texte cifrate ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ este un cifru simplu de substituție a literelor care înlocuiește o literă din text simplu cu litera $k$a în alfabet. Mai întâi generăm mai multe texte cifrate ROT-$k$ folosind valori diferite de $k$ pentru textul simplu care este partea sursă a datelor paralele. Apoi valorificăm aceste date de instruire criptate împreună cu datele paralele originale prin instruire multi-sursă pentru a îmbunătăți traducerea automată neurală. Metoda noastră, CipherDAug, utilizează o procedură de instruire inspirată de co-regularizare, nu necesită alte surse de date externe decât datele inițiale de instruire și utilizează un Transformer standard pentru a depăși tehnicile puternice de augmentare a datelor pe mai multe seturi de date cu o marjă semnificativă. Această tehnică se combină cu ușurință cu abordările existente pentru mărirea datelor și produce rezultate deosebit de puternice în setările cu resurse reduse.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en ny dataförstärkningsteknik för neural maskinöversättning baserad på ROT-$k$ chiffertexter. ROT-$k$ är ett enkelt bokstavsutbyte chiffer som ersätter en bokstav i klartext med $k$th bokstaven efter det i alfabetet. Vi genererar först flera ROT-$k$ chiffertexter med olika värden på $k$ för klartext som är källsidan till parallella data. Vi utnyttjar sedan dessa krypterade träningsdata tillsammans med de ursprungliga parallella data via multi-source utbildning för att förbättra neural maskinöversättning. Vår metod, CipherDAug, använder en co-regularisering inspirerad träningsprocedur, kräver inga externa datakällor förutom de ursprungliga träningsdata, och använder en standard Transformer för att överträffa starka dataökningstekniker på flera datauppsättningar med en betydande marginal. Denna teknik kombineras enkelt med befintliga metoder för dataökning, och ger särskilt starka resultat i lågresursinställningar.', 'so': 'Waxaynu horumarinaynaa teknikada kordhiska taariikhda qoraalka neurada ee lagu turjumo ROT-$k ciphertexts. ROT-$ waa qoraal sahlan bedelka oo ku beddela qoraal sahlan oo ku qoran qoraalka bannaanka oo qoraalka $ k a dib ku qoran qoraalka. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu sameynaa qoraal kala duduwan ROT-$k oo isticmaalaya qiimaha kala duduwan oo $k, kaas oo ah dhinaca macluumaadka lambarka ah. Markaas waxaynu u soo bandhignaa macluumaadkan waxbarashada ee la koobay iyo macluumaadkii asalka ah oo la simi karo si loo hagiyo tarjumaadka maskaxda neurada. CipherDAug wuxuu isticmaalaa koorasyada waxbarashada oo la soo waday, looma baahna sourceed dibadda ah oo aan ahayn data asalka ah ee waxbarashada, wuxuuna isticmaalaa tarafta standardka ah si uu u sameeyo qalabka kordhinta data oo xoogga ah oo lagu kordhiyo marxalad aad u weyn. Teknonikadan wuxuu si fudud ugu soo bandhigaa qaabab joogta ah oo u soo kordhiya data, wuxuuna keenaa sabab gaar ah oo xoog badan oo ka soo saara koritaanka hoose-resource.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo novu tehniku povećanja podataka za prevod neuralne mašine na temelju šifre ROT-k$. ROT-$k$ je jednostavan šifra za zamjenu pisma koja zamjenjuje pismo na prostom tekstu sa pismom od $k$t nakon toga na alfabetu. Prvo stvorimo višestruke šifre ROT-$k$ s različitim vrijednostima od $k$ za prosti tekst koji je izvorska strana paralelnih podataka. Potom ćemo iskoristiti ove šifrene podatke o obuci zajedno sa originalnim paralelnim podacima putem multiizvorske obuke za poboljšanje prevoda neuronskih strojeva. Naš metod, CipherDAug, koristi postupak za obuku koji je inspirisan u zajedničkoj regularizaciji, ne zahteva spoljne izvore podataka osim originalnih podataka o obuci, i koristi standardni transformator da bi izvršio jake tehnike povećanja podataka na nekoliko podataka značajnom marginom. Ova tehnika se lako kombinira sa postojećim pristupima povećanju podataka, i donosi posebno jake rezultate u postavkama niskih resursa.', 'si': 'අපි ROT-$k$ සිෆෙර්ටස් වලින් අධාරිත පද්ධතිය සඳහා න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් වාර්තාව සඳහා නියම් දත්ත- විශාල ROT-$k$ එක සාමාන්\u200dය අක්ෂරයක් වෙනුවෙන් සිෆෙර් එකක්. ඒක ඇල්ෆේබෙට් වලින් පස්සේ $k$th අක්ෂරයෙන් අක්ෂරයක් පෙනස් කරනවා. අපි මුලින්ම ගොඩක් ROT-$k$ සිෆ්රෙක්ටස් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරනවා, $k$ වෙනස් විශේෂ විශේෂ අගය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය පැත්තේ ප්\u200d ඊට පස්සේ අපි මේක ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සමඟ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සමඟ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂ කරන්න බොහොම ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200d අපේ විධානය, CipherDAug, සමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂණිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරනවා, මූලික ප්\u200dරේක්ෂණිත දත්ත වෙනුවෙන් එළිය දත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ තාක්ෂණය ලේසියෙන් තියෙන විදිහට තියෙන්නේ දත්ත විශාලනය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම විශේෂයෙන් බල', 'ur': 'ہم روٹ-$k$ سیفرٹکسٹس پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں نیورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے ایک نئی ڈیٹا-افزایش ٹیکنیک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. ROT-$k$ ایک ساده نامہ جایگزینی سیفر ہے جو اس کے بعد آلفابیٹ میں ایک نامہ کی جایگزینی کرتا ہے. ہم پہلے بہت سے ROT-$k$ سیفر ٹیکسٹ پیدا کریں گے کہ پارالی ٹیکسٹ کے لئے $k$ کے مختلف ارزش استعمال کرتے ہیں جو پارالی ڈاکٹ کے سراسر جانب ہے. اس کے بعد ہم نے اس محیط ترکینس ڈیٹا کو متعدد سورس ترکینس کے ذریعے ملتی سیورس ترکینس کے ذریعے مزید ترکینس کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ، سیفرڈاگ، ایک سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامنے سامن یہ ٹیکنیک آسانی سے موجود موجود طریقے کے ساتھ ڈیٹا افزایش کے ساتھ ملتی ہے، اور مخصوص مضبوط نتیجے کم منبع سازیوں میں اضافہ کرتے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ROT-$k சுற்று உரைகளை அடிப்படையிலான புதிய தகவல்-கூட்டுதல் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். ROT-$k என்பது ஒரு சுலபமான எழுத்து மாற்றும் கடல் ஆகும். அது வெளிப்படையான உரையில் ஒரு எழுத்தை மாற்றும் அல்பாபெட்டில் உள்ள $k எழுத்த @ info பின்னர் நாம் இந்த குறிப்பிட்ட பயிற்சி தரவை வழங்குகிறோம் மூலத்தின் மொழிமூலம் பயிற்சியை மேம்படுத்துவதற்காக பல ம எங்கள் முறைமை, சிபர் DAug, ஒரு ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தல் திருப்ப பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, முதல் பயிற்சி தகவலை தவிர வெளி தகவல் மூலம் தேவைப்படவில்லை, மற்றும் முக்கியமா இந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் தற்போதைய செயல்பாடுகளுடன் சுலபமாக இணைக்கும், மற்றும் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் அமைப்புகளில் மிக உறுதியான ம', 'uz': "Biz ROT-$k ciphertextlari asosida neyrolik mashinasi tarjima qilish uchun novel maʼlumot soʻzlashni talab qilamiz. ROT-$k - bir oddiy harfni almashtirish cipher, bu chegara matnning barcha $k dollari harfni alphabet'da almashtirish mumkin. Biz birinchi marta parallel maʼlumotning manbasi boʻyicha chegara $k qiymatlari bilan bir nechta ROT-$k ciphertextlarini yaratdik. Keyin biz bu taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni bajaramiz va asl parallel maʼlumotlar bilan bir necha manba-manba kompyuterning tarjimasini yaxshi ko'paytirish uchun bir xil maʼlumotni bajaramiz. CipherDAug, bir bir xil taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi dasturdan foydalanuvchi usuli asl taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar manbasiga yetarlicha kerak emas, va juda muhim margin bilan bir necha maʼlumotlar soʻzlashni bajarish uchun andoza tarjima qiladi. @ info", 'vi': "Chúng tôi đề xuất một k ỹ thuật gia tăng dữ liệu mới cho phiên dịch cỗ máy thần kinh dựa trên bản mã ROT., k tần số. Đây là một mật mã đơn giản thay th ế thư, thay thế một chữ cái ở hộp sơ đồ, với chữ cái sau đó trong bảng chữ cái. Đầu tiên chúng tôi tạo ra nhiều mã số ROT-W liên tục sử dụng các giá trị khác nhau của « k.'cho the plathiếu thư, which is the source side of the parallel data. Sau đó chúng ta sử dụng dữ liệu đào tạo vòng kèm theo các dữ liệu song song gốc thông qua huấn luyện đa nguồn để cải thiện dịch biến máy thần kinh. Mật mã của chúng tôi, sử dụng một thủ tục huấn luyện dựa trên việc luân hồi phối hợp, không yêu cầu nguồn dữ liệu ngoại trừ dữ liệu huấn luyện ban đầu, và sử dụng một Transformer để hoàn thành các kỹ thuật gia tăng dữ liệu mạnh trên nhiều bộ dữ liệu bằng một khoảng cách đáng kể. Kỹ thuật này kết hợp dễ dàng với phương pháp gia tăng dữ liệu hiện tại, và đem lại kết quả đặc biệt mạnh trong thiết lập ít nguồn.", 'bg': 'Предлагаме нова техника за увеличаване на данните за невронен машинен превод, базирана на кодови текстове ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ е прост шифър за заместване на букви, който замества буква в обикновен текст с $k$та буква след нея в азбуката. Първо генерираме множество шифрови текстове, използвайки различни стойности от $k$ за обикновения текст, който е източната страна на паралелните данни. След това използваме тези кодирани данни за обучение заедно с оригиналните паралелни данни чрез обучение с множество източници, за да подобрим невронния машинен превод. Нашият метод използва процедура за обучение, вдъхновена от съвместна регулировка, не изисква външни източници на данни, различни от оригиналните данни за обучение, и използва стандартен трансформатор, за да превъзхожда силните техники за увеличаване на данни на няколко набора от данни със значителен марж. Тази техника се съчетава лесно със съществуващите подходи за увеличаване на данните и дава особено силни резултати при настройки с ниски ресурси.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo novu tehniku povećanja podataka za prevod neuroloških strojeva na temelju šifra ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ je jednostavan šifra za zamjenu pisma koja zamjenjuje pismo na prostom tekstu s pismom k$t nakon toga na alfabetu. Prvo stvaramo višestruke šifre ROT-$k$ s različitim vrijednostima od $k$ za prosti tekst koji je izvorska strana paralelnih podataka. Potom ćemo upotrijebiti ove šifrirane podatke o obuci zajedno s originalnim paralelnim podacima putem multiizvornog obuke za poboljšanje prevoda neuronskih strojeva. Naš metod, CipherDAug, koristi postupak za obuku koji je inspirisan u zajedničkoj regularizaciji, ne zahtijeva spoljne izvore podataka osim originalnih podataka o obuci, i koristi standardni transformator kako bi nadmašio jake tehnike povećanja podataka na nekoliko podataka značajnom marginom. Ova tehnika se lako kombinira s postojećim pristupima povećanju podataka, a donosi posebno jake rezultate u postavkama niskih resursa.', 'nl': 'We stellen een nieuwe data-augmentatie techniek voor neurale machinevertaling voor op basis van ROT-$k$ versleutelteksten. ROT-$k$ is een eenvoudige lettervervangingscode die een letter in de platte tekst vervangt door de $k$th letter ernaast in het alfabet. We genereren eerst meerdere ROT-$k$ codeteksten met verschillende waarden van $k$ voor de platte tekst die de bronzijde van de parallelle gegevens is. Vervolgens gebruiken we deze gecodeerde trainingsgegevens samen met de originele parallelle gegevens via multi-source training om neurale machinevertaling te verbeteren. Onze methode, CipherDAug, maakt gebruik van een co-regularisatie geïnspireerde trainingsprocedure, vereist geen externe gegevensbronnen anders dan de originele trainingsgegevens en maakt gebruik van een standaard Transformer om sterke data augmentatie technieken op verschillende datasets met een aanzienlijke marge te overtreffen. Deze techniek combineert gemakkelijk met bestaande benaderingen van data augmentatie, en levert bijzonder sterke resultaten op in omgevingen met weinig resources.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en ny data-augmentation teknik til neural maskinoversættelse baseret på ROT-$k$ ciphertekster. ROT-$k$ er en simpel bogstav substitution chiffer, der erstatter et bogstav i almindelig tekst med $k$th bogstav efter det i alfabetet. Vi genererer først flere ROT-$k$ ciphertekster ved hjælp af forskellige værdier på $k$ for den almindelige tekst, som er kildesiden af de parallelle data. Vi udnytter derefter disse indkodede træningsdata sammen med de oprindelige parallelle data via multi-source træning for at forbedre neural maskinoversættelse. Vores metode, CipherDAug, bruger en co-regularisering inspireret træningsprocedure, kræver ingen eksterne datakilder ud over de oprindelige træningsdata, og bruger en standard Transformer til at udføre stærke dataaugmentationsteknikker på flere datasæt med en betydelig margin. Denne teknik kombineres nemt med eksisterende tilgange til dataforøgelse og giver særligt stærke resultater i indstillinger med lav ressource.', 'de': 'Wir schlagen eine neuartige Datenauswertungstechnik für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung vor, die auf ROT-$k$ Chiffrtexten basiert. ROT-$k$ ist eine einfache Buchstabenersatzchiffre, die einen Buchstaben im Klartext durch den $k$ten Buchstaben im Alphabet ersetzt. Zunächst generieren wir mehrere ROT-$k$ Chiffrtexte mit unterschiedlichen Werten von $k$ für den Klartext, der die Quellseite der parallelen Daten ist. Anschließend nutzen wir diese verschlüsselten Trainingsdaten zusammen mit den ursprünglichen parallelen Daten über Multi-Source-Training, um die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung zu verbessern. Unsere Methode, CipherDAug, verwendet ein Co-Regularisierung-inspiriertes Trainingsverfahren, benötigt keine externen Datenquellen außer den ursprünglichen Trainingsdaten und verwendet einen Standard-Transformer, um starke Datenerweiterungstechniken auf mehreren Datensätzen signifikant zu übertreffen. Diese Technik lässt sich problemlos mit bestehenden Ansätzen zur Datenauswertung kombinieren und liefert besonders starke Ergebnisse in ressourcenarmen Umgebungen.', 'id': 'We propose a novel data-augmentation technique for neural machine translation based on ROT-$k$ ciphertexts.  ROT-$k$ is a simple letter substitution cipher that replaces a letter in the plaintext with the $k$th letter after it in the alphabet.  Kami pertama-tama menghasilkan beberapa teks cipher ROT-$k$ menggunakan nilai berbeda $k$ untuk teks jelas yang merupakan sisi sumber data paralel. Kemudian kita menggunakan data pelatihan ini di lingkungan bersama dengan data paralel asli melalui pelatihan multisumber untuk meningkatkan terjemahan mesin saraf. Metode kami, CipherDAug, menggunakan prosedur latihan yang diinspirasi oleh koregularisasi, tidak membutuhkan sumber data luar selain data latihan asli, dan menggunakan Transformer standar untuk melampaui teknik peningkatan data yang kuat pada beberapa set data dengan margin yang signifikan. Teknik ini bergabung dengan mudah dengan pendekatan yang ada untuk peningkatan data, dan memberikan hasil yang sangat kuat dalam pengaturan sumber daya rendah.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 ROT-k$밀문을 기반으로 한 신경 기계 번역 데이터 증강 기술을 제시했다.ROT-$k$는 간단한 알파벳 교체 암호로 명문의 알파벳 하나를 알파벳 뒤에 있는 $k$의 첫 번째 알파벳으로 바꿉니다.우선 병렬 데이터 원본의 명문으로 서로 다른 $k$값을 사용하여 여러 개의 ROT-$k$밀문을 생성합니다.그리고 우리는 암호화된 훈련 데이터와 원시 병행 데이터를 이용하여 다원적인 훈련을 통해 신경기계 번역을 개선한다.우리의 방법인 CipherDAug은 원시 훈련 데이터를 제외하고 외부 데이터 원본이 필요하지 않고 표준 변환기를 사용하여 여러 데이터 집합에서 강력한 데이터 증강 기술보다 현저히 우수하다.이런 기술은 기존의 데이터 확충 방법과 결합하기 쉬우며 저자원 환경에서 특히 강한 효과를 낸다.', 'fa': 'ما یک تکنیک افزایش داده\u200cهای رمانی برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی بر اساس متن\u200cهای رمز ROT-$k دلار پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ROT-$k$ یک رمز رمز جایگزینی نامه ساده است که نامه\u200cای در متن پایین با نامه\u200cی k$ بعد از آن در الفبا جایگزینی می\u200cکند. اولین بار متن رمزگذاری ROT-$k$ را با استفاده از ارزش های مختلف از k$ برای متن پایین تولید می کنیم که منبع داده های پارالی است. سپس ما این اطلاعات آموزش محاصره را با داده های مرتبط اصلی از طریق آموزش های متعدد منبع برای تغییرات ماشین عصبی بهبود می کنیم. روش ما، CipherDAug، از یک روش آموزش الهام\u200cبخش\u200cهای همسایه\u200cسازی استفاده می\u200cکند، هیچ منبع داده\u200cهای خارجی جز داده\u200cهای آموزش اصلی نیاز ندارد، و از یک تغییردهنده استاندارد استفاده می\u200cکند تا تکنیک افزایش داده\u200cهای قوی بر چند تنظیم داده\u200cها این تکنیک به راحتی با روش\u200cهای موجود برای افزایش داده\u200cها ترکیب می\u200cکند و به خصوص نتیجه\u200cهای قوی در تنظیمات منابع کم می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza teknolojia ya kuongeza takwimu za kisasa kwa kutafsiri mashine ya kiserikali kwa kutumia ujumbe wa jumbe za ROT-$k. Dola za ROT-Dola ni nyepesi ya barua ya kubadilisha barua yenye barua ya wazi kwa barua ya dola za kimarekani baada ya kuingia kwenye alfabeti. Kwanza tunatengeneza ujumbe wa jumbe za ramani za mkononi na dola za kimarekani kwa kutumia thamani tofauti za dola za kimarekani kwa ajili ya ujumbe wa wazi ambao ni chanzo cha taarifa za usambazaji. Kisha tunatumia taarifa hizi za mafunzo zilizojumuisha pamoja na taarifa za asili zilizofanana kupitia mafunzo ya vyanzo vingi ili kuboresha tafsiri ya mashine ya neura. Utawala wetu, CipherDAug, hutumia mchakato wa mafunzo yanayohamasishwa kwa ushirikiano, hauhitaji vyanzo vya data vya nje isipokuwa taarifa za awali za mafunzo, na inatumia Transfer wa kiwango cha kawaida ili kutengeneza mbinu za kuongeza taarifa kali kwenye seti mbalimbali za takwimu zinazoonyesha viwango vya muhimu. Kiteknolojia hiki kinaunganisha kwa urahisi na mbinu za kuwepo kwa kuongeza taarifa, na hutoa matokeo yenye nguvu katika mazingira ya rasilimali chini.', 'tr': 'ROT-$k$ ciphertextlere daýanýan neiral maşynyň terjimesi üçin bir roman maglumaty eklemek teknikini teklip edip görýäris. ROT-$k$ alfabetten soň bir hat yerine koyan basit bir hat šifredir İlk olarak paralel verilerin çeşme tarafından $k$ değerlerini kullanarak çoklu ROT-$k$ şifrelemeleri oluşturuyoruz. Sonra bu ähli köpürli eğitim maglumatyny näyral maşynyň terjimesini geliştirmek üçin özüniň parallel maglumatyny bilen birleşdirdik. Biziň metodamyz, CipherDAug, koregularizasyýan-esinden gelen eğitim prosedyny ulanýar, munyň başga daşarydaky maglumat maglumatyndan başga daşarydaky daşaryk çeşmeleri gerek däldir we munyň beýleki maglumat setirlerinde güýçli maglumat tekniklerini ýitirmek üçin standart terjime edi Bu tehnik bar maglumatlar ýetişdirmegi üçin aňsatlyk bilen birleşýär we ýöne güýçli netijesi azak resurslar düzümlerinde getirir.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n nuwe data- augmentasie teknike vir neurale masjien vertaling gebaseer op ROT-$k$ syfertekste. ROT-$k$ is 'n eenvoudige brief vervang siffer wat 'n brief in die eenvoudige teks vervang met die $k$th brief na dit in die alfabet. Ons genereer eerste veelvuldige ROT -$k$ syferteks met verskillende waardes van $k$ vir die eenvoudige teks wat is die bron kant van die parallele data. Ons het dan hierdie omgekeerde onderwerp data saam met die oorspronklike parallele data deur multibronne onderwerp om neurale masjien vertaling te verbeter. Ons metode, CipherDAug, gebruik 'n co-regularisasie-inspireerde onderwerp prosedure, benodig geen eksterne data bronne ander as die oorspronklike onderwerp data, en gebruik 'n standaard Transformeerder om sterke data vergroot teknike op verskeie datastelle te uitvoer deur 'n betekende marge. Hierdie tekniks kombinieer maklik met bestaande toegang tot data augmentasie, en gee spesifieke sterke resultate in lae hulpbron instellings.", 'am': 'የሮT-$k ክፍተቶችን በመጠቀም የደዌብ መሳሪያ ትርጉም የዳታ-አካባቢ ቴክኖክን እናሳልቃለን፡፡ ROT-$k የጽሑፉን ደብዳቤ በሜዳ ጽሑፍ የሚለውጥ የጽሑፍ ቀላል ደብዳቤ ነው፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የዶላር ዶላር ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም የዶላር ዶላር ዋጋዎችን ለመጠቀም የሜዳ ጽሑፍ አካባቢ የሮት-$k ጽሑፎችን እናፈጥራለን፡፡ በኋላም የናውሬል መሣሪያን ትርጉም ለማድረግ በብዙ-source ትምህርት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የሳፊርዳug ስሕተታችን፣ የውጭ የዳታ ማህበረሰብ ፕሮጀክት የሚጠይቅ የውጭ የዳታ ምንጮች ከአውሮው ማህበረሰብ በቀር አይፈለጉም፣ እናም በአካባቢው ክፍል ላይ ብርቱ ዳታ አጨማሪነት ቴክኖክቶችን ለማድረግ የstandard Transfer የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ይህ ስህተት በተገኘው የዳታ አቀማመጥ ማቀናቀል በቀላል ማቀናቀል እና በተለየ የዝቅተኛ resource ማዘጋጀት ፍሬዎችን ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një teknikë të re të rritjes së të dhënave për përkthimin e makinave nervore bazuar në tekstet e kodit ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ është një kod i thjeshtë zëvendësimi i letrave që zëvendëson një letër në tekst të qartë me letrën e $k$th pas saj në alfabet. Ne së pari gjenerojmë shumë tekste kodesh ROT-$k$ duke përdorur vlera të ndryshme $k$ për tekstin e qartë që është anë burimi e të dhënave paralele. Pastaj përdorim këto të dhëna të trajnimit të rrethuar së bashku me të dhënat origjinale paralele nëpërmjet trajnimit me shumë burime për të përmirësuar përkthimin e makinave nervore. Metoda jonë, CipherDAug, përdor një procedurë stërvitjeje të frymëzuar nga koregularizimi, nuk kërkon burime të dhënash të jashtme përveç të dhënave origjinale stërvitjeje dhe përdor një Transformer standard për të kaluar teknikat e forta të rritjes së të dhënave në disa grupe të dhënash me një margin të rëndësishëm. This technique combines easily with existing approaches to data augmentation, and yields particularly strong results in low-resource settings.', 'az': 'Biz ROT-$k$ ciphertextlərinə dayanan nöral maşın çevirilməsi üçün yeni məlumat-artırma teknikini təklif edirik. ROT-$k$ alfabədən sonra səhifələrin yerinə gətirən basit bir məktub əvəzi şifrədir. Biz ilk dəfə paralel məlumatların mənbəzi tərəfindən müxtəlif qiymətləri ilə çox ROT-$k$ şifrələri yaradırıq. Sonra nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün çoxlu mənbə təhsil təhsil vasitəsilə birlikdə bu müəyyən edilmiş təhsil məlumatlarını yaratdıq. Bizim metodumuz, CipherDAug, co-regularization-inspired təhsil proqramını istifadə edir, orijinal təhsil məlumatlarından başqa dış məlumatların mənbələrini istifadə edir, və bir çox məlumatların çox güclü məlumatları artırmaq tekniklərindən istifadə edir. Bu tehnika məlumatların artırması üçün çox asanlıqla birləşdirir və özlərinə də çox qüvvətli sonuçlar düşük resursu ayarlarında verir.', 'bn': 'ROT-$k সিফারেক্টের ভিত্তিতে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য আমরা একটি নভেল ডাটা যোগাযোগ প্রযুক্তি প্রস্তাব করি। ROT-$k একটি সাধারণ চিঠি প্রতিস্থাপন সিফার যা স্পষ্ট ট টেক্সটে একটি চিঠি প্রতিস্থাপন করে অ্যালফাবেটে তার পরে $k চিঠি দিয়ে। প্রথমে আমরা বিভিন্ন মান বিভিন্ন মান ব্যবহার করে প্যারালেল ডাটার উৎস। We then leverage this enciphered training data along with the original parallel data via multi-source training to improve neural machine translation.  আমাদের পদ্ধতি, সিফার ডায়াগ, একটি সহ-নিয়ন্ত্রণ-অনুপ্রাপ্ত প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করে, প্রাথমিক প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ছাড়া কোন বাইরে তথ্যের উৎস নেই এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মার এই প্রযুক্তিটি সহজে বিদ্যমান উপায়ের সাথে সংযুক্ত করে ডাটা যোগাযোগ করে এবং বিশেষ করে কম-সম্পদের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর ফলাফলের ফলাফল', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր տվյալների բարձրացման տեխնիկա նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար, հիմնված ROT-$k$ խորհրդագրությունների վրա: ROT-$k$ պարզ տառերի փոխարինման խորհրդանիշ է, որը փոխարինում է տառը ճշգրիտ տեքստում $k$րորդ տառով, որից հետո բառերում: Սկզբում մենք ստեղծում ենք բազմաթիվ ROT-$k$ գաղտնագրական տեքստեր, օգտագործելով $k$ տարբեր արժեքներ պարզ տեքստի համար, որը զուգահեռ տվյալների աղբյուրն է: Այնուհետև մենք օգտագործում ենք այս ծածկագրված ուսումնասիրության տվյալները միասին սկզբնական զուգահեռ տվյալների միջոցով բազմաաղբյուրների ուսումնասիրության միջոցով, որպեսզի բարելավենք նյարդային մե Մեր մեթոդը, ՍիֆերԴաուգը, օգտագործում է կոռեգորիզացիայի ոգեշնչված ուսումնասիրության գործընթաց, չի պահանջում ոչ մի արտաքին տվյալների աղբյուր, բացի արտաքին ուսումնասիրության տվյալներից, և օգտագործում է ստանդարտ Տանսֆերմեր, որպեսզի ավելի Այս տեխնիկան հեշտությամբ համադրվում է տվյալների աճի գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումների հետ և հանգեցնում է հատկապես ուժեղ արդյունքներ ցածր ռեսուրսների միջավայրում:', 'bs': 'Predlažemo novu tehniku povećanja podataka za prevod neuralne mašine na temelju šifre ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ je jednostavan šifra za zamjenu pisma koja zamjenjuje pismo na prostom tekstu sa pismom od $k$t nakon toga na alfabetu. Prvo stvorimo višestruke šifre ROT-$k$ s različitim vrijednostima $k$ za prosti tekst koji je izvorska strana paralelnih podataka. Potom ćemo uključiti ove šifrirane podatke o obuci zajedno s originalnim paralelnim podacima putem multiizvorske obuke kako bi poboljšali prevod neuralnih strojeva. Naš metod, CipherDAug, koristi postupak za obuku koji je inspirisan u zajedničkoj regularizaciji, ne zahtijeva spoljne izvore podataka osim originalnih podataka o obuci, i koristi standardni transformator kako bi izvršio jake tehnike povećanja podataka na nekoliko podataka značajnom marginom. Ova tehnika se lako kombinira sa postojećim pristupima povećanju podataka, a donosi posebno jake rezultate u nastavama niskih resursa.', 'ca': "Proposem una nova tècnica d'augment de dades per a la traducció de màquines neurals basada en codificacions ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ és un codi simple de substitució de lletres que substitueix una lletra al texte clar amb la lletra $k$s després d'això a l'alfabet. Primer generam múltiples codificacions ROT-$k$ utilitzant diferents valors de $k$ per al texte senzill que és el costat fontal de les dades paralleles. Després aprofitem aquestes dades d'entrenament encriptades juntament amb les dades paralleles originals a través d'entrenaments multifonts per millorar la traducció neuromàtica. El nostre mètode, CipherDAug, utilitza un procediment de formació inspirat en la co-regularisació, no requereix fonts externes de dades que no siguin les dades originals de formació, i utilitza un Transformer estàndard per superar les tècniques fortes d'augment de dades en diversos conjunts de dades amb un marge significatiu. Aquesta tècnica es combina fàcilment amb els enfocaments existents al augment de les dades, i produeix resultats particularment forts en ambients de baix recursos.", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme novou techniku rozšíření dat pro neuronový strojový překlad založenou na ROT-$k$ šifrovacích textech. ROT-$k$ je jednoduchá šifra náhrady písmen, která nahrazuje písmeno v prostém textu $k$th písmenem za ním v abecedě. Nejprve generujeme více ROT-$k$ šifrovacích textů pomocí různých hodnot $k$ pro prostý text, který je zdrojovou stranou paralelních dat. Tato šifrovaná tréninková data pak spolu s původními paralelními daty využíváme prostřednictvím více zdrojů pro zlepšení neuronového strojového překladu. Naše metoda, CipherDAug, využívá tréninkový postup inspirovaný společnou regularizací, nevyžaduje žádné externí zdroje dat kromě původních tréninkových dat a používá standardní Transformer, který výrazně překoná techniky silného rozšíření dat na několika datových sadách. Tato technika se snadno kombinuje s existujícími přístupy k rozšíření dat a přináší obzvláště silné výsledky v nastavení s nízkými zdroji.', 'et': 'Pakume välja uudse andmete suurendamise tehnika neuromasintõlke jaoks, mis põhineb ROT-$k$ šifertekstidel. ROT-$k$ on lihtne tähe asendamise šifer, mis asendab lihtteksti tähe tähestiku järel $k$th tähega. Esiteks genereerime mitu ROT-$k$ ciferteksti, kasutades erinevaid väärtusi $k$ lihtteksti jaoks, mis on paralleelsete andmete lähtekülg. Seejärel kasutame neid krüpteeritud koolitusandmeid koos originaalsete paralleelsete andmetega mitmeallilise koolituse kaudu, et parandada närvilise masintõlke tõlget. Meie meetod CipherDAug kasutab kaasregulatsioonist inspireeritud koolitusprotseduuri, ei vaja muid väliseid andmeallikaid peale algsete koolitusandmete ja kasutab standardset Transformerit, et saavutada mitmete andmekogumite tugevaid andmete suurendamise tehnikaid märkimisväärselt. See tehnika ühendab kergesti olemasolevate andmete suurendamise lähenemisviisidega ja annab eriti tugevaid tulemusi vähese ressursiga seadetes.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme uutta datan augmentaatiotekniikkaa neurokonekääntämiseen, joka perustuu ROT-$k$ salausteksteihin. ROT-$k$ on yksinkertainen kirjainkorvaussäätö, joka korvaa yksinkertaisen tekstin kirjaimen aakkosissa olevalla $k$th kirjaimella. Luomme ensin useita ROT-$k$ salaustekstejä käyttäen eri arvoja $k$ tasatekstille, joka on rinnakkaisen datan lähdepuoli. Tämän jälkeen hyödynnämme tätä salattua harjoitusdataa yhdessä alkuperäisen rinnakkaisdatan kanssa monilähdekoulutuksen avulla neurokonekäännöksen parantamiseksi. Menetelmämme, CipherDAug, käyttää yhteissäännöstelyyn perustuvaa koulutusmenettelyä, ei vaadi muita ulkoisia tietolähteitä kuin alkuperäiset harjoitustiedot, ja käyttää standardimuunninta, joka ylittää vahvat tiedonlisäystekniikat useissa tietosarjoissa merkittävästi. Tämä tekniikka yhdistyy helposti olemassa oleviin tietojen lisäämiseen liittyviin lähestymistapoihin ja tuottaa erityisen vahvoja tuloksia vähävaraisissa asetuksissa.', 'sk': 'Predlagamo novo tehniko povečanja podatkov za nevronsko strojno prevajanje, ki temelji na kodirnih besedilih ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ je preprosta šifra zamenjave črk, ki zamenja črko v navadnem besedilu s črko $k$th za njo v abecedi. Najprej ustvarimo več ROT-$k$ šifratnih besedil z uporabo različnih vrednosti $k$ za navadno besedilo, ki je izvorna stran vzporednih podatkov. Nato izkoristimo te šifrirane podatke o usposabljanju skupaj z originalnimi vzporednimi podatki prek usposabljanja iz več virov za izboljšanje nevronskega strojnega prevajanja. Naša metoda, CipherDAug, uporablja postopek usposabljanja, ki temelji na koregulaciji, ne zahteva nobenih zunanjih virov podatkov, razen originalnih podatkovnih podatkov, in uporablja standardni transformator za precejšnjo stopnjo izboljšanja tehnik povečanja podatkov na več naborih podatkov. Ta tehnika se zlahka združuje z obstoječimi pristopi k povečanju podatkov in prinaša posebej močne rezultate v nastavitvah z nizkimi viri.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 ngeruhi, ng챕w챕 nggawe data-ampungan teknik kanggo tarjamahan Njuk, nggawe barang nggambar LOT-$k$cifftexts. paper size Anytime Defs Rasan챕 awakdh챕w챕, Ciph Daug, digawe sistem sistem sing kompatimulasan-kompatimulasan langgambar terus-sistem sing isin챕 dadi tanggal dh챕w챕, gak dh챕w챕 sistem sing gak dh챕w챕 dadi tanggal dh챕w챕, lan usukak챕 Standard Transformer nggawe sistem sing gak dh챕w챕 dadi ampungan teknik sing gak dh챕w챕 Genjer-teknik iki ditambah gampang kanggo kalagayaan kanggo dianggap kanggo awak dh챕w챕 buturan dadi, lan manggad kuwi tindakan sing ngomong keamanan akeh dh챕w챕.', 'ha': "Munã buɗa wani takin ƙaramako da data-ƙari na yanzu wa fassarar maɓallin neura a kan karatun na rubutun $ kowaci na rubutu. @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Sa'an nan kuma muna samun wannan da aka juma da data na shirin da data na farko da parallel through multi-source wa mafarin wa improve translation of neural. ShiryatinMu, CifDAug, yana amfani da wani aikin shirin da aka yi wahayi da shi, ba ya buƙata wani sourcen data na ƙarƙashin gaba fãce data na farko, kuma yana amfani da Transformer na daidaita don ya sami wasu tufãfin augmentation data masu ƙaranci kan wasu database na da margin mai girma. Wannan tekinki yana haɗa sauri da sauƙi da hanyoyin zaman zuwa ƙarin data, kuma yana fitar da matsalar masu ƙarfi cikin kayan-resource.", 'bo': 'We propose a novel data-augmentation technique for neural machine translation based on ROT-$k$ ciphertexts. ROT-$k$ འདི་ཡིག་རྩིས་ཐོག་ནང་གི་ཡིག We first generate multiple ROT-$k$ ciphers using different values of $k$ for the plaintext which is the source side of the parallel data. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐོར་ལས་དབུལ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། Our method, CipherDAug, uses a co-regularization-inspired training procedure, requires no external data sources other than the original training data, and uses a standard Transformer to outperform strong data augmentation techniques on several datasets by a significant margin. དངོས་འབྲེལ་འདིས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སླ་བསྡད་ཐབས་མེད་པར། དམིགས་བསལ་རུང་བའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཉུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་འབྱུང་།', 'he': 'אנו מציעים טכניקה חדשה של גידול נתונים לתרגום מכונות עצביות מבוססת על סיפרטקסטים ROT-$k$. ROT-$k$ הוא ציפור להחליף מכתבים פשוט שמחליף מכתב בטקסט עם מכתב K$th אחריו באלפת. ראשית אנחנו יוצרים מסמכי ציפור ROT-$k$ מרובים באמצעות ערכים שונים של $k$ עבור הטקסט הברור שהוא הצד המקורי של הנתונים המקבלים. ואז אנו מנצלים את נתוני האימונים המסופרים האלה יחד עם נתונים המקומיים המקוריים באמצעות אימון ממקורים רבים כדי לשפר את התרגום המכונה העצבית. השיטה שלנו, סיפרדאג, משתמשת בתהליך אימון מעורר השראה משותף, לא דורשת מקורות נתונים חיצוניים מלבד נתוני האימון המקוריים, ושתמשת בטרנספורר סטנדרטי כדי להעביר את טכניקות גידול נתונים חזקות על מספר קבוצות נתונים על ידי גבול משמעותי. This technique combines easily with existing approaches to data augmentation, and yields particularly strong results in low-resource settings.'}
{'en': 'WatClaimCheck A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'ar': 'توليد المفردات المبنية على التداخل يحسن النقل عبر اللغات بين اللغات ذات الصلة', 'fr': 'La génération de vocabulaire basée sur le chevauchement améliore le transfert interlinguistique entre les langues apparentées', 'es': 'La generación de vocabulario basada en superposiciones mejora la transferencia multilingüe entre idiomas relacionados', 'pt': 'A geração de vocabulário baseada em sobreposição melhora a transferência entre idiomas entre idiomas relacionados', 'ja': 'オーバーラップベースのボキャブラリー生成は、関連する言語間のクロスリンガル転送を改善します', 'hi': 'ओवरलैप-आधारित शब्दावली जनरेशन संबंधित भाषाओं के बीच क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर में सुधार करता है', 'zh': '盖重词汇成改相关语言之间', 'ru': 'Формирование словарного запаса на основе перекрытия улучшает межъязыковую передачу между родственными языками', 'ga': 'Feabhsaíonn Giniúint Stór Focal Forluí-bhunaithe Aistriú Trasteangach I measc Theangacha Gaolmhara', 'ka': 'სიტყვებულის შექმნა დამატებული სიტყვებულების გარეშე უფრო სიტყვებულების გარეშე', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία λεξιλογίου με βάση την επικάλυψη βελτιώνει τη διασυνοριακή μεταφορά μεταξύ σχετικών γλωσσών', 'hu': 'Az átfedő alapú szókincsek generálása javítja a nyelvek közötti transzfert a kapcsolódó nyelvek között', 'it': 'La generazione di vocabolari sovrapposti migliora il trasferimento multilingue tra lingue correlate', 'mk': 'Overlap-based Vocabulary Generation Improves Cross-lingual Transfer Among Related Languages', 'kk': 'Тіркелген сөзді құру тілдерінің арасындағы көп тілді тасымалдау', 'lt': 'Pagrindinė žodyno generacija gerina tarpkalbinį perkėlimą tarp susijusių kalbų', 'ms': 'Penjanaan Kamus berdasarkan lapisan meningkatkan Pemindahan Selasa-Bahasa diantara Bahasa Terkait', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni Vokabulari bbażata fuq l-għarfien kollu ttejjeb it-Trasferiment Translingwali Fost il-Lingwi Relatati', 'ml': 'ഭാഷകളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mn': 'Үүний үндсэн үг хэлний төлөө хэлний хооронд олон хэлний дамжуулалтыг сайжруулдаг.', 'pl': 'Generowanie słowników opartych na nakładce poprawia transfer między językami pokrewnymi', 'no': 'Overlapp-basert ordgenerator forbedrar krysspråk overføring mellom tilhøyrande språk', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩ කරනවා', 'ro': 'Generarea vocabularului bazată pe suprapunere îmbunătățește transferul translingvistic între limbile conexe', 'sr': 'Prekrijumčarenje generacije rečnika poboljšava preko jezika među povezanim jezicima', 'so': 'Generation of vocabulary based on Overlap Improves Transfer of Cross-luqad Among Related Languages', 'sv': 'Överlappbaserad vokabulärgenerering förbättrar tvärspråklig överföring bland relaterade språk', 'ta': 'தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளுக்கிடையில் மேல்லாண்டிய சொற்கோவை உருவாக்குதலை மேம்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'اورلپ بنیاد آواز کلاولیری پیدائش کروس زبان ترنسفور کی نسبت مرتبہ زبانوں میں اضافہ کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nền văn học phổ biến lấn át', 'hr': 'Prekrijumčarenje generacije riječnika poboljšava preko jezika među povezanim jezicima', 'bg': 'Генерирането на речник въз основа на презаписване подобрява междуезичния трансфер между сродните езици', 'nl': 'Op overlap gebaseerde woordenschat genereren verbetert de meertalige overdracht tussen verwante talen', 'da': 'Overlap-baseret ordforråd generation forbedrer tværsproget overførsel blandt beslægtede sprog', 'de': 'Überlappungsbasierte Vokabelgenerierung verbessert den sprachübergreifenden Transfer zwischen verwandten Sprachen', 'id': 'Generasi Vocabulari Berdasarkan Overlap meningkatkan Transfer Selasa Bahasa diantara Bahasa Terhubung', 'fa': 'نسل کلمه\u200cهای زیادی بر پایه\u200cگذاری، انتقال کلمه\u200cهای زیادی بین زبان\u200cهای ارتباط بهبود می\u200cکند', 'sw': 'Uzalisho wa lugha yenye msingi wa lugha unaorodhesha uhamiaji wa lugha na lugha zinazohusiana', 'ko': '중첩된 어휘 생성을 바탕으로 관련 언어 간의 다중 언어 이동을 개선하였다', 'tr': 'Üstüne tabanly sözlük döredişi Syýasy Diller arasynda', 'af': 'Oorskryf- gebaseerde Voorwoordeboek Generasie verbeter kruistale Oordrag onder verwante tale', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i fjalëkalimit me bazë të përmirësimit përmirëson transferimin ndërgjuhësor midis gjuhëve të lidhura', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች', 'hy': 'Առանձնացված բառարանի ստեղծումը բարելավում է փոխլեզվի փոխանցումը հարաբերված լեզուների միջև', 'bn': 'ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভাষাভিত্তিক শব্দভাণ্ডারের প্রজন্ম ক্রস-ভাষার ভাষার মধ্যে যোগাযোগী ভাষার মধ্যে সংয', 'az': 'Sözlük Üstünlüyü Üstünlüyü İlişkil Dillərin arasında çox dilli Transferi uzlaşdırır', 'bs': 'Prekrijumčarenje generacije riječnika poboljšava preko jezika među povezanim jezicima', 'ca': 'La generació de vocabulari basada en la superfície millora la transferència translingüística entre les llengües relacionades', 'cs': 'Generování slovní zásoby založené na překrytí zlepšuje přenos mezi jazyky mezi souvisejícími jazyky', 'et': 'Ülekuulutuspõhine sõnavara genereerimine parandab keeleülest ülekannet seotud keelte vahel', 'fi': 'Overlap-pohjainen sanastogenerointi parantaa kielienvälistä siirtoa sukulaisten kielten välillä', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Relative', 'sk': 'Generacija besednjaka, ki temelji na prekrivanju, izboljša medjezični prenos med sorodnimi jeziki', 'bo': 'Overlap-based Vocabulary Generation Improves Cross-lingual Transfer Among Related Languages', 'he': 'גידול מילים מבוסס על מעטפת משפר את העברת שפתיים בין שפות קשורות'}
{'en': 'We contribute a new dataset for the task of automated fact checking and an evaluation of state of the art algorithms The dataset includes claims from speeches interviews social media and news articles review articles published by professional fact checkers and premise articles used by those professional fact checkers to support their review and verify the veracity of the claims An important challenge in the use of premise articles is the identification of relevant passages that will help to infer the veracity of a claim We show that transferring a dense passage retrieval model trained with review articles improves the retrieval quality of passages in premise articles We report results for the prediction of claim veracity by inference from premise articles', 'ar': 'أظهرت نماذج اللغات متعددة اللغات المدربة مسبقًا مثل mBERT و XLM-R إمكانات كبيرة للنقل عبر اللغات بدون طلقة إلى لغات منخفضة موارد الويب (LRL). ومع ذلك ، نظرًا لسعة النموذج المحدودة ، فإن الاختلاف الكبير في أحجام المجموعات أحادية اللغة المتاحة بين لغات موارد الويب العالية (HRL) و LRLs لا يوفر نطاقًا كافيًا لتضمين LRL مع HRL ، مما يؤثر على أداء المهام النهائية من LRLs. في هذه الورقة ، نجادل في أن الارتباط بين اللغات في عائلة لغوية على طول بُعد التداخل المعجمي قد يتم الاستفادة منه للتغلب على بعض القيود الجسدية في LRLs. نقترح Overlap BPE (OBPE) ، وهو تعديل بسيط ولكنه فعال لخوارزمية توليد مفردات BPE التي تعزز التداخل عبر اللغات ذات الصلة. من خلال تجارب مكثفة على مهام ومجموعات بيانات متعددة في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، نلاحظ أن OBPE يولد مفردات تزيد من تمثيل LRLs عبر الرموز المميزة المشتركة مع HRLs. يؤدي هذا إلى تحسين نقل اللقطة الصفرية من HRLs ذات الصلة إلى LRLs دون تقليل تمثيل ودقة HRL. على عكس الدراسات السابقة التي رفضت أهمية تداخل الرمز المميز ، نظهر أنه في إعداد اللغة ذات الموارد المنخفضة ، فإن التداخل المميز مهم. يمكن أن يؤدي تقليل التداخل الصناعي إلى الصفر إلى انخفاض يصل إلى أربعة أضعاف في دقة نقل اللقطة الصفرية.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques multilingues pré-entraînés tels que MBERt et XLM-R ont démontré un grand potentiel pour le transfert interlinguistique zero-shot vers des langues à faibles ressources Web (LRL). Cependant, en raison de la capacité limitée du modèle, la grande différence entre les tailles des corpus monolingues disponibles entre les langages à ressources Web élevées (HRL) et les LRL ne permet pas de co-intégrer la LRL avec la HRL, affectant ainsi la performance des tâches en aval des LRL. Dans cet article, nous soutenons que la relation entre les langues d'une famille linguistique selon la dimension du chevauchement lexical peut être mise à profit pour surmonter certaines des limites des corpus des LRL. Nous proposons Overlap BPE (Overlap BPE), une modification simple mais efficace de l'algorithme de génération de vocabulaire BPE qui améliore le chevauchement entre les langues associées. Grâce à des expériences approfondies sur de multiples tâches et ensembles de données de PNL, nous observons que l'OBPE génère un vocabulaire qui augmente la représentation des LRL via des jetons partagés avec les URL. Cela permet d'améliorer le transfert de tir zéro des HRL connexes vers les LRL sans réduire la représentation et la précision des HRL. Contrairement aux études précédentes qui ont rejeté l'importance du chevauchement de jetons, nous montrons que dans le contexte de langage associé à de faibles ressources, le chevauchement de jetons est important. La réduction synthétique du chevauchement à zéro peut entraîner une diminution jusqu'à quatre fois de la précision du transfert de tir zéro.", 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos multilingües previamente entrenados, como mBert y XLM-R, han demostrado un gran potencial para la transferencia interlingüística sin límites a lenguajes con pocos recursos web (LRL). Sin embargo, debido a la capacidad limitada del modelo, la gran diferencia en los tamaños de los corpus monolingües disponibles entre los lenguajes de alto contenido de recursos web (HRL) y los LRL no proporciona suficiente margen para integrar conjuntamente el LRL con el HRL, lo que afecta el desempeño de las tareas posteriores de los LRL. En este artículo, argumentamos que la relación entre los idiomas de una familia lingüística a lo largo de la dimensión de la superposición léxica puede aprovecharse para superar algunas de las limitaciones corporales de los LRL. Proponemos Overlap BPE (OBPE), una modificación simple pero efectiva del algoritmo de generación de vocabulario BPE que mejora la superposición entre idiomas relacionados. A través de extensos experimentos en múltiples tareas y conjuntos de datos de PNL, observamos que OBPE genera un vocabulario que aumenta la representación de los LRL a través de tokens compartidos con los HRL. Esto da como resultado una mejor transferencia cero de los HRL relacionados a los LRL sin reducir la representación y precisión de los HRL. A diferencia de estudios anteriores que descartaron la importancia de la superposición de tokens, mostramos que en el entorno del lenguaje relacionado con bajos recursos, la superposición de tokens es importante. Reducir sintéticamente la superposición a cero puede causar una caída de hasta cuatro veces en la precisión de la transferencia de tiro cero.', 'pt': 'Modelos de idiomas multilíngues pré-treinados, como mBERT e XLM-R, demonstraram grande potencial para transferência de vários idiomas para idiomas com poucos recursos da Web (LRL). No entanto, devido à capacidade limitada do modelo, a grande diferença nos tamanhos dos corpora monolíngues disponíveis entre as linguagens de alto recurso da web (HRL) e as LRLs não fornece escopo suficiente para co-incorporar a LRL com a HRL, afetando assim o desempenho da tarefa a jusante de LRL. Neste artigo, argumentamos que o parentesco entre as línguas em uma família linguística ao longo da dimensão da sobreposição lexical pode ser aproveitado para superar algumas das limitações dos corpora das LRLs. Propomos o Overlap BPE (OBPE), uma modificação simples, mas eficaz, do algoritmo de geração de vocabulário BPE que aumenta a sobreposição entre idiomas relacionados. Por meio de extensos experimentos em várias tarefas e conjuntos de dados de NLP, observamos que o OBPE gera um vocabulário que aumenta a representação de LRLs por meio de tokens compartilhados com HRLs. Isso resulta em uma melhor transferência de tiro zero de HRLs relacionados para LRLs sem reduzir a representação e a precisão de HRL. Ao contrário de estudos anteriores que descartaram a importância da sobreposição de tokens, mostramos que na configuração de linguagem relacionada a poucos recursos, a sobreposição de tokens é importante. Reduzir sinteticamente a sobreposição para zero pode causar uma queda de até quatro vezes na precisão da transferência zero-shot.', 'ja': 'MBERTやXLM - Rなどの事前にトレーニングされた多言語モデルは、低いWebリソース言語（ LRL ）へのゼロショットのクロスリンガル転送の大きな可能性を示しています。 しかしながら、限定されたモデル容量のために、高ウェブリソース言語（ ＨＲＬ ）とＬＲＬとの間の利用可能な単一言語のコーパのサイズの大きな差は、ＬＲＬをＨＲＬと共埋め込むのに十分な範囲を提供せず、それによってＬＲＬのダウンストリームタスクパフォーマンスに影響を与える。 この論文では、言語ファミリー内の言語間の関連性が、LRLのコーパスの制限のいくつかを克服するために活用される可能性があると主張している。 関連言語間のオーバーラップを強化するBPEボキャブラリー生成アルゴリズムへのシンプルで効果的な修正であるOverlap BPE （ OBPE ）を提案します。 複数のNLPタスクとデータセットに関する広範な実験を通じて、OBPEは、HRLと共有されたトークンを介してLRLの表現を増加させるボキャブラリーを生成することを観察します。 これにより、HRL表現と精度を低下させることなく、関連するHRLからLRLへのゼロショット転送が改善されます。 トークンオーバーラップの重要性を否定した以前の研究とは異なり、低リソース関連の言語設定では、トークンオーバーラップが重要であることを示しています。 オーバーラップをゼロに合成的に減らすと、ゼロショット転送精度が4倍も低下する可能性があります。', 'zh': '先训多言(如mBERTXLM-R)已见出向卑Web资言(LRL)零次跨语移之巨潜。 然模形有限,高 Web 资言 (HRL) LRL 之间,可以单语语料库大小差异,无以给足 LRL 与 HRL 同销,以妨 LRL 下流之任。 本文,臣等以为可以言语词汇重维度者相关性以克LRL语料库限。 臣等建重BPE(OBPE),此BPE词汇生算法之简而有效者也,可增重言语之间。 因NLP数集之广实验,观OBPE生为词汇表,因HRL共享之令牌以益LRL之代表性。 可以改善自关 HRL 至于 LRL 零次传输,而不降 HRL 之准确性。 与前否令牌重重不同,明于低资源相关语设,令牌重叠也。 综而减之零会零射传精降四倍。', 'hi': 'MBERT और XLM-R जैसे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित बहुभाषी भाषा मॉडल ने कम वेब-संसाधन भाषाओं (LRL) के लिए शून्य-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल स्थानांतरण के लिए महान क्षमता का प्रदर्शन किया है। हालांकि, सीमित मॉडल क्षमता के कारण, उच्च वेब-संसाधन भाषाओं (एचआरएल) और एलआरएल के बीच उपलब्ध मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पोरेट के आकार में बड़ा अंतर एचआरएल के साथ एलआरएल को सह-एम्बेड करने की पर्याप्त गुंजाइश प्रदान नहीं करता है, जिससे एलआरएल के डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्य प्रदर्शन को प्रभावित किया जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम तर्क देते हैं कि लेक्सिकल ओवरलैप के आयाम के साथ एक भाषा परिवार में भाषाओं के बीच संबंधितता को एलआरएल की कुछ कॉर्पोरेट सीमाओं को दूर करने के लिए लाभ उठाया जा सकता है। हम ओवरलैप बीपीई (ओबीपीई) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो बीपीई शब्दावली पीढ़ी एल्गोरिथ्म के लिए एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी संशोधन है जो संबंधित भाषाओं में ओवरलैप को बढ़ाता है। कई एनएलपी कार्यों और डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम देखते हैं कि ओबीपीई एक शब्दावली उत्पन्न करता है जो एचआरएल के साथ साझा किए गए टोकन के माध्यम से एलआरएल के प्रतिनिधित्व को बढ़ाता है। इसके परिणामस्वरूप एचआरएल प्रतिनिधित्व और सटीकता को कम किए बिना संबंधित एचआरएल से एलआरएल में बेहतर शून्य-शॉट स्थानांतरण होता है। पिछले अध्ययनों के विपरीत, जिन्होंने टोकन-ओवरलैप के महत्व को खारिज कर दिया, हम दिखाते हैं कि कम-संसाधन से संबंधित भाषा सेटिंग में, टोकन ओवरलैप मायने रखता है। सिंथेटिक रूप से ओवरलैप को शून्य तक कम करने से शून्य-शॉट ट्रांसफर सटीकता में चार गुना गिरावट के रूप में ज्यादा हो सकता है।', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные многоязычные языковые модели, такие как mBERT и XLM-R, продемонстрировали большой потенциал для кросс-лингвистической передачи с нулевым выстрелом на языки с низким уровнем веб-ресурсов (LRL). Однако из-за ограниченной пропускной способности модели, большая разница в размерах доступных одноязычных корпусов между языками с высокими веб-ресурсами (HRL) и LRLs не обеспечивает достаточный объем совместного внедрения LRL с HRL, тем самым влияя на выполнение задач LRLs ниже по потоку. В этой статье мы утверждаем, что связь между языками в языковой семье вдоль измерения лексического перекрытия может быть использована для преодоления некоторых ограничений LRL. Мы предлагаем Overlap BPE (OBPE), простую, но эффективную модификацию алгоритма генерации словаря BPE, которая усиливает перекрытие между родственными языками. Путем обширных экспериментов над несколькими задачами и наборами данных NLP, мы наблюдаем, что OBPE генерирует словарь, который увеличивает представление LRL через токены, совместно используемые с HRL. Это приводит к улучшению передачи нулевого выстрела от связанных HRL к LRL без снижения представления и точности HRL. В отличие от предыдущих исследований, в которых игнорировалась важность перекрытия токенов, мы показываем, что при настройке языка, связанного с низким объемом ресурсов, перекрытие токенов имеет значение. Синтетическое уменьшение перекрытия до нуля может привести к четырехкратному падению точности передачи с нулевым выстрелом.', 'ga': 'Tá cumas iontach léirithe ag samhlacha teanga ilteangacha réamhoilte ar nós mBERT agus XLM-R le haghaidh aistrithe trasteangacha gan seatanna chuig teangacha íseal-acmhainne gréasáin (LRL). Mar sin féin, mar gheall ar chumas na samhla teoranta, ní sholáthraíonn an difríocht mhór i méideanna na gcorpra aonteangacha atá ar fáil idir teangacha ard-acmhainne gréasáin (HRL) agus LRLanna a dhóthain scóip chun an LRL a chomhleabú leis an HRL, rud a chuireann isteach ar fheidhmíocht an taisc iartheachtach. de LRLs. Sa pháipéar seo, áitíonn muid go bhféadfaí leas a bhaint as gaolmhaireacht i measc teangacha i dteaghlach teanga feadh toise an fhorluí foclóireachta chun cuid de theorainneacha corpraithe na LRLanna a shárú. Molaimid Overlap BPE (OBPE), modhnú simplí ach éifeachtach ar algartam giniúna stór focal BPE a chuireann le forluí thar theangacha gaolmhara. Trí thurgnaimh fhairsing ar thascanna agus tacair shonraí iomadúla NLP, tugaimid faoi deara go ngineann OBPE stór focal a mhéadaíonn ionadaíocht LRLanna trí chomharthaí a roinntear le HRLanna. Is é an toradh atá air seo ná feabhas ar aistriú náid urchar ó HRLanna gaolmhara go LRLanna gan laghdú ar léiriú agus cruinneas HRL. Murab ionann agus staidéir roimhe seo a rinne neamhaird ar an tábhacht a bhaineann le forluí comharthaí, léirímid go bhfuil forluí comharthaí i gceist sa suíomh teanga a bhaineann le hacmhainní íseal. Is féidir an forluí a laghdú go nialas go sintéiseach a chur faoi deara oiread agus titim ceithre huaire ar chruinneas aistrithe náid lámhaigh.', 'ka': 'მრავალური ენების მოდელები, როგორც mBERT და XLM-R, უფრო დიდი პოტენციალური პროგრამის გადატანისთვის ნულ-სტრანქტის კრესტრანქტის ენაში (LRL) მოდენსტირებულია. მაგრამ, მარტივი მოდელური კოპორაციის შესახებ, დიდი განსხვავება მონოლენგური კოპორაციის ზომაში, რომელიც უფრო დიდი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო ენების (HRL) და LRL-ის შორის შორის განსხვავებაში არ უფრო დიდი გან ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ვთქვათ, რომ ენების სახლში ელექსიკალური გადარჩენების განზომილების განზომილებით, შეიძლება იქნება, რომ LRL-ის ზოგიერთი ზოგიერთი კოპორორის განზომილებების გადარჩენა. ჩვენ მინდომათ BPE (OBPE) გადაწყვეტილება, რომელიც უფრო მხოლოდ ეფექტიური რედაქტირება BPE სიტყვებლის განვითარების ალგორიტიმს, რომელიც შეუძლებელია გადაწყვეტილება განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტებით, რამდენიმე NLP დავალების და მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაზე, ჩვენ დაახერხებთ, რომ OBPE იქნება სიტყვებულაცია, რომელიც განსაზღვრებას LRLs-ს გამოყენება ეს შემდეგ გაუკეთებულია ნულ სტრიქტის გადატანსტი HRLs-დან LRLs-დან, რომელიც HRL-ს გამოსახულება და წარმოდგენება არ შემდეგ. წინა კვლევების განმავლობაში, რომლებიც ცოცხლის გასანიშვნელობის გასანიშვნელობა, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ცოცხლის მნიშვნელობაში, რომლებიც დაკავშირებულია ენის სინტეტიკურად შემდეგ გადასრულება ნულისთვის შეიძლება იქნება, რაც 4-ჯერ გადასრულება ნულის გადასრულება.', 'hu': 'Az előre képzett többnyelvű nyelvű modellek, mint például az mBERT és az XLM-R, nagy lehetőséget mutattak arra, hogy az alacsony webes erőforrásokkal rendelkező nyelvekre (LRL) keresztnyelvű átvitelt zéró felvételekkel rendelkezzenek. A korlátozott modellkapacitás miatt azonban a magas weberőforrásokkal rendelkező nyelvek (HRL) és LRL-ek közötti nagy különbség a rendelkezésre álló egynyelvű korpuszok mérete között nem biztosít elegendő lehetőséget arra, hogy az LRL és a HRL együttes beágyazására, ezáltal befolyásolja az LRL-ek downstream feladatteljesítményét. Ebben a tanulmányban azzal érvelünk, hogy egy nyelvcsaládban lévő nyelvek közötti kapcsolat a lexikai átfedés dimenziója mentén felhasználható az LRL-ek egyes korlátainak leküzdésére. Javasoljuk az Overlap BPE (OBPE), egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony módosítást a BPE szókincs generálási algoritmusának, amely fokozza az átfedést a kapcsolódó nyelvek között. Több NLP feladaton és adatkészleten végzett kiterjedt kísérletek révén megfigyeljük, hogy az OBPE olyan szókincset hoz létre, amely növeli az LRL megjelenítését a HRL-ekkel megosztott tokenek segítségével. Ez a kapcsolódó HRL-ekről LRL-ekre történő javítást eredményez anélkül, hogy csökkentené a HRL reprezentációját és pontosságát. A korábbi tanulmányokkal ellentétben, amelyek elutasították a token-átfedés fontosságát, azt mutatjuk, hogy az alacsony erőforrásokkal kapcsolatos nyelvi beállításokban a token-átfedés fontos. Az átfedés szintetikus nullára történő csökkentése akár négyszeres csökkenést is okozhat a nulla lövés átviteli pontosságában.', 'el': 'Προεκπαιδευμένα πολύγλωσσα μοντέλα γλωσσών όπως το mBERT και το XLM-R έχουν αποδείξει μεγάλες δυνατότητες για μηδενική διασυνοριακή μεταφορά σε γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας στο διαδίκτυο (LRL). Ωστόσο, λόγω της περιορισμένης ικανότητας μοντέλου, η μεγάλη διαφορά στα μεγέθη των διαθέσιμων μονογλωσσικών σωμάτων μεταξύ γλωσσών υψηλών διαδικτυακών πόρων (HRL) και LRL δεν παρέχει επαρκές πεδίο συνενσωμάτωσης της LRL με την HRL, επηρεάζοντας έτσι την απόδοση των μεταγενέστερων εργασιών των LRL. Σε αυτή την εργασία, υποστηρίζουμε ότι η συγγένεια μεταξύ γλωσσών σε μια γλωσσική οικογένεια κατά μήκος της διάστασης της λεξικής επικάλυψης μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για να ξεπεραστούν ορισμένοι από τους περιορισμούς των σωμάτων των LRL. Προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική τροποποίηση του αλγόριθμου δημιουργίας λεξιλογίου που ενισχύει την επικάλυψη μεταξύ των σχετικών γλωσσών. Μέσα από εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε πολλαπλές εργασίες και σύνολα δεδομένων παρατηρούμε ότι η OBPE παράγει ένα λεξιλόγιο που αυξάνει την αναπαράσταση των LRL μέσω Tokens που μοιράζονται με HRL. Αυτό έχει ως αποτέλεσμα τη βελτιωμένη μεταφορά μηδενικού πυροβολισμού από τις σχετικές HRL σε LRL χωρίς μείωση της αναπαράστασης και της ακρίβειας HRL. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες μελέτες που απέρριψαν τη σημασία της επικάλυψης σήματος, καταδεικνύουμε ότι στη ρύθμιση γλώσσας που σχετίζεται με χαμηλούς πόρους, η επικάλυψη σήματος έχει σημασία. Η συνθετική μείωση της επικάλυψης στο μηδέν μπορεί να προκαλέσει έως και τετραπλάσια πτώση στην ακρίβεια μεταφοράς μηδενικού πυροβολισμού.', 'it': "Modelli linguistici multilingue pre-formati come mBERT e XLM-R hanno dimostrato un grande potenziale per il trasferimento cross-lingual zero-shot a lingue a basso contenuto di risorse web (LRL). Tuttavia, a causa della limitata capacità del modello, la grande differenza nelle dimensioni dei corpora monolingue disponibili tra linguaggi ad alta risorsa web (HRL) e LRL non fornisce sufficiente spazio di co-incorporazione dell'LRL con l'HRL, influenzando così le prestazioni delle attività a valle delle LRL. In questo articolo, sosteniamo che la relazione tra le lingue in una famiglia linguistica lungo la dimensione della sovrapposizione lessicale può essere sfruttata per superare alcuni dei limiti corporali delle LRL. Proponiamo Overlap BPE (OBPE), una modifica semplice ma efficace all'algoritmo di generazione del vocabolario BPE che migliora la sovrapposizione tra i linguaggi correlati. Attraverso ampi esperimenti su più attività e set di dati NLP, osserviamo che OBPE genera un vocabolario che aumenta la rappresentazione delle LRL tramite token condivisi con HRL. Ciò si traduce in un trasferimento zero-shot migliorato da HRL correlati a LRL senza ridurre la rappresentazione e l'accuratezza HRL. A differenza di studi precedenti che hanno respinto l'importanza della sovrapposizione di token, mostriamo che nell'impostazione del linguaggio correlato a basse risorse, i token si sovrappongono. Ridurre sinteticamente la sovrapposizione a zero può causare un calo di quattro volte nella precisione di trasferimento zero-shot.", 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengti daugiakalbiai modeliai, pavyzdžiui, mBERT ir XLM-R, parodė didelę galimybę nuliniu būdu perkelti įvairias kalbas į mažai tinklo išteklių turinčias kalbas (LRL). Tačiau dėl ribotų modelių pajėgumų didelis turimų vienakalbių korporų dydžio skirtumas tarp didelių tinklo išteklių kalbų (angl. high web resource languages, HRL) ir LRL nesuteikia pakankamai galimybių LRL sujungti su HRL, taigi daro įtaką LRL tolesniems uždaviniams. Šiame dokumente teigiame, kad kalbų šeimos tarpusavio ryšys atsižvelgiant į lexinio dubliavimo dimensiją gali būti naudojamas siekiant įveikti kai kuriuos LRL korporacinius apribojimus. Mes siūlome apskritą BPE (OBPE), paprastą, bet veiksmingą BPE žodynų generacijos algoritmo pakeitimą, kuris padidina susijusių kalbų dubliavimą. Atliekant išsamius eksperimentus, susijusius su keliomis NLP užduotimis ir duomenų rinkiniais, pastebime, kad OBPE sukuria žodyną, kuriuo didinamas LRL atstovavimas naudojant ženklus, dalijamus su HRL. Tai lemia geresnį nulinio nuotolio perkėlimą iš susijusių HRL į LRL, nesumažinant HRL reprezentatyvumo ir tikslumo. Priešingai nei ankstesniuose tyrimuose, kurie atmetė ženklų dubliavimo svarbą, mes rodome, kad mažai išteklių turinčiose kalbose ženklų dubliavimo klausimai. Sintetiškai mažinant dubliavimąsi iki nulio gali sumažėti iki keturių kartų nulinio nuotolio perdavimo tikslumas.', 'kk': 'МБЕРТ және XLM- R секілді бірнеше тіл үлгілерінің алдында оқылған көп тіл үлгілері нөл тілінің көпшілік тілдер тілдеріне (LRL) ауыстыру мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Бірақ үлгі көлемі шектелген сияқты, веб- ресурс тілдері (HRL) мен LRL арасындағы жеткілікті монолингі корпора өлшемінің көлемі HRL- мен LRL- ді біріктіру үшін жеткілікті масштабы жоқ, сондықтан LRL тапсырмаларының төменгі тапсы Бұл қағазда, біз тілдердің тілдерінің қатынасы, лексикалық қатынасының өлшемі бойынша, LRL корпора шектеулерінің бірнеше шектеулерін көтеруге мүмкін. Біз BPE (OBPE) тілдерін қарапайым, әлі эффективні түрлендіру алгоритміне қарапайым, бірақ бPE сөздерді құру алгоритмінің алгоритмін ұсынамыз. Бірнеше NLP тапсырмалары мен деректер қорлары туралы кеңейтілген тәжірибелер арқылы, OBPE HRL- мен бөлінген белгілер арқылы LRL- нің көрінісін көтеретін сөзді құрады. Бұл HRL көрсетілімін және дұрыстығын азайту жоқ HRL- ден LRL- ге сәйкес келген нөл- сүрлі тасымалдау үшін жақсартылады. Алдыңғы зерттеулердің маңыздылығын келтірген зерттеулеріне сәйкес, біз тіл бағдарламаларының төмен ресурстар қатынасын көрсетедік. Синтетикалық түрлендіруді нөлге шектеу нөлге төрт рет шектеу дұрыстығын шектеуге болады.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa berbilang-bahasa yang dilatih dahulu seperti mBERT dan XLM-R telah menunjukkan potensi yang besar untuk pemindahan bahasa-bahasa bernilai sifar ke bahasa-sumber web yang rendah (LRL). Namun, disebabkan kapasitas model terbatas, perbezaan besar dalam saiz korpra monobahasa yang tersedia diantara bahasa sumber web tinggi (HRL) dan LRL tidak menyediakan skop yang cukup untuk menyambung LRL dengan HRL, dengan itu mempengaruhi prestasi tugas turun LRL. Dalam kertas ini, kita berdebat bahawa hubungan antara bahasa dalam keluarga bahasa sepanjang dimensi penyelamatan leksikal mungkin digunakan untuk mengatasi beberapa batasan corpora LRL. Kami melamar Overlap BPE (OBPE), perubahan sederhana tetapi berkesan kepada algoritma generasi vokbulari BPE yang meningkatkan overlap melalui bahasa berkaitan. Melalui eksperimen luas pada beberapa tugas NLP dan set data, kami memperhatikan bahawa OBPE menghasilkan vokbulari yang meningkatkan perwakilan LRL melalui token berkongsi dengan HRL. This results in improved zero-shot transfer from related HRLs to LRLs without reducing HRL representation and accuracy.  Tidak seperti kajian terdahulu yang menolak penting token-overlap, kami menunjukkan bahawa dalam tetapan bahasa berkaitan sumber rendah, token overlap perkara. Secara sintetik mengurangkan salinan ke sifar boleh menyebabkan sebanyak empat kali turun dalam akurasi pemindahan sifar-tembakan.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട പലിഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d എംബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും എക്സ്\u200cഎംഎംഎംഎം- ആരും പൂജ്യത്തിലേക്കുള്ള ക്രോസ്ഗുള്\u200d ഭാഷ മാറ്റുന്നതിന്  എന്നാലും മോഡലിന്റെ സാധ്യതയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ടതിനാല്\u200d, ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വെബ്- റിസോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ലഭ്യമായ മണോളില്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയുടെ വലിപ്പം വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി LRL-നോട്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നു, ഭാഷയുടെ കുടുംബത്തില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നത് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d മേല്\u200dപ്പുകളുടെ മേഖലയില്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d മൂടുന്നത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഓപ്ലാപ് BPE (OBPE) പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ബിപെയിലെ പദവിയുടെ തലമുറതലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d വളര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. അത് ബന്ധപ് ഒരുപാട് NLP ജോലികളിലും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നോക്കുന്നു, OBPE ഒരു പദാവലിയെ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അത് HRLകളോടൊപ്പം പങ HRLs-ല്\u200d നിന്നും LRLകളിലേക്കും സംസാരിക്കാതെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വെടിയുടെ മാറ്റം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള വിദ്യാഭാഷയുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്തിന്റെ പ്രാധാന്യം നീക്കം ചെയ്തിട്ടുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി നമ്മള്\u200d  Synthetically reducing the overlap to zero can cause as much as a four-fold drop in zero-shot transfer accuracy.', 'mk': 'Преобучени мултијазични модели како што се mBERT и XLM-R покажаа голем потенцијал за нула-снимка крстојазичен трансфер на јазици со ниски веб-ресурси (LRL). Сепак, поради ограничениот моделен капацитет, големата разлика во големината на достапните монојазични корпора помеѓу јазиците со високи веб-ресурси (HRL) и LRLs не обезбедува доволно опсег за коинтегрирање на LRL со HRL, со што влијае на понатамошната задача на LRL. Во овој весник, тврдиме дека врската меѓу јазиците во јазичкото семејство долж димензијата на лексикалната прекривка може да биде искористена за надминување на некои од корпоралните ограничувања на ЛРЛ. Предложуваме Прекршење на БПЕ (ОБПЕ), едноставна, но ефикасна модификација на алгоритмот на генерацијата на зборовите на БПЕ, кој го зголемува прекршењето на поврзаните јазици. Со експерименти на повеќе НЛП задачи и податоци, набљудуваме дека ОБПЕ генерира речник кој го зголемува претставувањето на ЛРЛ преку знаци споделени со ХРЛ. Ова резултира со подобрен трансфер со нула стрела од поврзани ХРЛ на ЛРЛ без намалување на претставувањето и прецизноста на ХРЛ. За разлика од претходните студии кои ја отфрлија важноста на прекривањето на знаците, покажуваме дека во поставувањето на јазикот поврзан со ниските ресурси, знаците се прекриваат. Синтетично намалувањето на прекривањето на нула може да предизвика четирипати намалување на прецизноста со нула стрела.', 'mt': 'Mudelli multilingwi mBERT u XLM-R imħarrġa minn qabel urew potenzjal kbir għal trasferiment translingwi b’sensiela żero għal lingwi b’riżorsi web baxxi (LRL). Madankollu, minħabba kapaċità limitata ta’ mudell, id-differenza kbira fid-daqsijiet tal-korpura monolingwi disponibbli bejn il-lingwi b’riżorsi għoljin tal-internet (HRL) u l-LRLs ma tipprovdix biżżejjed ambitu biex l-LRL tiġi inkorporata mal-HRL, u b’hekk taffettwa l-prestazzjoni tal-kompiti downstream tal-LRLs. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna jargumentaw li r-relazzjoni bejn il-lingwi f’familja ta’ lingwi tul id-dimensjoni ta’ sovrappożizzjoni lexikali tista’ tiġi sfruttata biex jingħelbu xi wħud mill-limitazzjonijiet korpora tal-LRLs. Aħna nipproponu Overlap BPE (OBPE), modifika sempliċi iżda effettiva għall-algoritmu tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-vokabulari BPE li ttejjeb id-duplikazzjoni bejn il-lingwi relatati. Permezz ta’ esperimenti estensivi fuq kompiti u settijiet ta’ dejta multipli tal-NLP, ninsabu li l-OBPE jiġġenera vokabulari li jżid ir-rappreżentanza tal-LRLs permezz ta’ tokens kondiviżi mal-HRLs. Dan jirriżulta fi trasferiment aħjar b’żero-shot minn HRLs relatati għal LRLs mingħajr ma titnaqqas ir-rappreżentanza u l-preċiżjoni tal-HRL. Għall-kuntrarju ta’ studji preċedenti li ċaħdu l-importanza ta’ duplikazzjoni ta’ sinjali, nagħmlu evidenza li fl-isfond lingwistiku relatat ma’ riżorsi baxxi, kwistjonijiet ta’ duplikazzjoni ta’ sinjali. It-tnaqqis sintetiku tal-koinċidenza għal żero jista’ jikkawża kemm tnaqqis ta’ erba’ darbiet fil-preċiżjoni tat-trasferiment b’żero shot.', 'mn': 'МБЕРТ болон XLM-R зэрэг олон хэл загваруудын өмнө сургалтын загварууд нь шууд хэл дээр хэлбэрээр бага веб-ресурс хэл (LRL) руу шилжүүлэх боломжтой байдлыг харуулсан. Гэвч загварын чадвараа хязгаарлагдсан учраас, Веб-ресурс хэл (HRL) болон LRL-ын хоорондох нэг хэл хэлбэрийн том ялгаа нь LRL-г HRL-тэй холбогдох хангалттай бөгөөд LRL-ын давхар ажил үйлдвэрлэлийг нөлөөлж чадахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний гэр бүлийн хэлний хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байдал нь ЛРЛ-ын корпора хязгаарын хэмжээсүүдийг алдагдах боломжтой байж болно. Бид BPE (OBPE) дулаарлыг дулаарлын алгоритмын хувьд нэмэгдүүлэх энгийн боловч үр дүнтэй өөрчлөлтийг санал болгож байна. Олон NLP даалгавар болон өгөгдлийн сан дээр олон өргөн туршилтаар, OBPE нь HRL-тэй хуваалцагдаж LRL-ын үзүүлэлтийг нэмэгдүүлэх үг бий болгож байна. Энэ нь HRL илэрхийлэл болон зөв байдлыг багасгахгүйгээр холбоотой HRL-ээс LRL руу 0-шууд шилжүүлэлтийг сайжруулсан. Өмнөх судалгаанаас хоорондоо тодорхойлолтын чухал ач холбогдолтой гэсэн судалгаанаас ялгаатай, бид бага боловсролын холбогдолтой хэл хэлний тодорхойлолтын тулд тодорхойлолтыг харуулдаг. Синтетик тэгшитгэлийг багасгах нь тэгшитгэлийн давхарга зөвхөн дөрвөн удаа багасгах боломжтой.', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone wielojęzyczne modele językowe, takie jak mBERT i XLM-R, wykazały duży potencjał dla zero-shot cross-językowego transferu do niskich języków internetowych (LRL). Jednakże ze względu na ograniczoną pojemność modelu duża różnica w rozmiarach dostępnych jednojęzycznych korpusów między językami o wysokich zasobach internetowych (HRL) a LRL nie zapewnia wystarczającego zakresu współosadzenia LRL z HRL, co wpływa na wydajność zadań LRL w dalszym szczeblu. W niniejszym artykule argumentujemy, że związek między językami w rodzinie języków wzdłuż wymiaru nakładania się leksykalicznego może być wykorzystany do przezwyciężenia niektórych ograniczeń korpusów LRL. Proponujemy Overlap BPE (OBPE), prostą, ale skuteczną modyfikację algorytmu generowania słownictwa BPE, który zwiększa nakładanie się między powiązanymi językami. Poprzez obszerne eksperymenty na wielu zadaniach NLP i zbiorach danych obserwujemy, że OBPE generuje słownictwo, które zwiększa reprezentację LRL za pośrednictwem tokenów udostępnianych z HRL. Skutkuje to poprawę przenoszenia zerowego strzału z powiązanych HRL do LRL bez zmniejszenia reprezentacji i dokładności HRL. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich badań, które odrzucały znaczenie nakładania się tokenów, pokazujemy, że w ustawieniach językowych związanych z niskimi zasobami, nakładanie się tokenów ma znaczenie. Syntetyczne zmniejszenie nakładania się do zera może spowodować aż czterokrotny spadek dokładności transferu zerowego.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice multilingve pre-instruite, cum ar fi mBERT și XLM-R, au demonstrat un mare potențial pentru transferul interlingvistic zero-shot către limbi cu resurse web scăzute (LRL). Cu toate acestea, datorită capacității limitate a modelului, diferența mare între dimensiunile corporelor monolingve disponibile între limbile cu resurse web mari (HRL) și LRL nu oferă suficient domeniu de aplicare a asocierii LRL cu HRL, afectând astfel performanța activităților din aval a LRL. În această lucrare, susținem că relația dintre limbile dintr-o familie lingvistică de-a lungul dimensiunii suprapunerii lexicale poate fi folosită pentru a depăși unele dintre limitările corporale ale LRL. Propunem Overlap BPE (OBPE), o modificare simplă, dar eficientă a algoritmului de generare a vocabularului BPE, care îmbunătățește suprapunerea între limbile conexe. Prin experimente extinse pe mai multe sarcini și seturi de date NLP, observăm că OBPE generează un vocabular care crește reprezentarea LRL-urilor prin intermediul token-urilor partajate cu HRL-urile. Acest lucru duce la îmbunătățirea transferului zero-shot de la HRL conexe la LRL fără a reduce reprezentarea HRL și precizia. Spre deosebire de studiile anterioare care au respins importanța suprapunerii token-urilor, arătăm că în setarea limbajului legat de resurse reduse, token-urile suprapun probleme. Reducerea sintetică a suprapunerii la zero poate provoca o scădere de patru ori a preciziei transferului zero-shot.', 'sr': 'Pre-obučeni multijezički modeli kao što su mBERT i XLM-R pokazali su veliki potencijal za prebacivanje nula pogođenog prekršnog jezika na niske jezike mrežnih resursa (LRL). Međutim, zbog ograničenog modelskog kapaciteta, velika razlika u veličini dostupnog monojezičkog korporacije između visokih jezika web-resursa (HRL) i LRL ne pruža dovoljno područja zajednostavljanja LRL sa HRL-om, tako da utječe na sledeće funkcije LRL-a. U ovom papiru tvrdimo da povezanost među jezicima u jezičkoj porodici duž dimenzije leksičkog preklapanja može biti uticala na prevladavanje nekih korpornih ograničenja LRL-a. Predlažemo da preoklapamo BPE (OBPE), jednostavnu, ali efikasnu modifikaciju algoritma generacije rečnika BPE, koji povećava preoklapanje na odnosim jezicima. Kroz široke eksperimente o višestrukim NLP zadacima i setima podataka, posmatramo da OBPE stvara rečnik koji povećava predstavljanje LRL-a putem znakova koji su podijeljeni sa HRL-ima. To je rezultat poboljšanog prebacivanja nule snimke od povezanih HRL-a na LRL-e bez smanjenja predstavljanja HRL-a i tačnosti. Za razliku od prethodnih ispitivanja koji su odbacili važnost preklapanja znakova, pokazujemo da u nastavku jezika povezanih sa niskim resursima znakovi prelapaju stvari. Sintetièki smanjenje preklapanja na nulu može uzrokovati četiri puta pad taènosti premeštaja nula.', 'no': 'Førehandsvis fleirspråk-modeller som mBERT og XLM-R har demonstrert stor potensial for null-shot krysspråk-overføring til låg nettressursspråk (LRL). Av grunn av begrenset modelskapasitet, er det store forskjellen i storleiken på tilgjengelege monolinguiske korpora mellom høg nettressursspråk (HRL) og LRL ikkje tilgjengelege nok område for å kopla inn LRL med HRL, slik at det gjer påvirkninga av LRL-oppgåva ned. I denne papiret argumenterer vi at relateditet blant språk i eit språksfamilie langs dimensjonen av leksisk overlapping kan vera levert til å overvåka nokre av korporgrensene av LRL. Vi foreslår overlapping av BPE (OBPE), eit enkelt, men effektivt endring til algoritmen for BPE- laging av ordbokstavar som forbetrar overlapping over tilhøyrande språk. Gjennom utvida eksperimenter på fleire NLP- oppgåver og datasett, observerer vi at OBPE lagar eit ordbok som aukar representasjonen av LRLs via tokens delt med HRLs. Dette resulterer i forbetra overføring av nullsatt frå relaterte HRL til LRL utan å redusera HRL-representasjon og nøyaktighet. I motsetning til førre studier som avslutta viktigheten for token-overlapping, viser vi at i den låg ressursrelaterte språkkinnstillinga overlapper sakene. Syntetisk reduksjon av overlappen til null kan føra til å sleppa så mykje som fire gangar i nøyaktighet for overføring av null-bilde.', 'sv': 'Förutbildade flerspråkiga språkmodeller som mBERT och XLM-R har visat stor potential för noll-skott tvärspråklig överföring till språk med låga webbresurser (LRL). På grund av begränsad modellkapacitet ger den stora skillnaden i storleken på tillgängliga enspråkiga korpora mellan språk med hög webbresurs (HRL) och LRL inte tillräckligt utrymme för att inbädda LRL med HRL, vilket påverkar LRL:s aktiviteter i efterföljande led. I denna uppsats argumenterar vi för att relationen mellan språk i en språkfamilj längs dimensionen av lexikal överlappning kan utnyttjas för att övervinna några av korporabegränsningarna i LRL. Vi föreslår Overlap BPE (OBPE), en enkel men effektiv modifiering av BPE ordförråd generation algoritm som förbättrar överlappning över relaterade språk. Genom omfattande experiment på flera NLP-uppgifter och datauppsättningar observerar vi att OBPE genererar ett ordförråd som ökar representationen av LRL via tokens som delas med HRL. Detta resulterar i förbättrad noll-shot överföring från relaterade HRL till LRL utan att minska HRL representation och noggrannhet. Till skillnad från tidigare studier som avfärdade betydelsen av token-överlappning, visar vi att token-överlappning spelar roll i den lågresursrelaterade språkinställningen. Syntetiskt reducera överlappningen till noll kan orsaka så mycket som en fyrfaldig minskning av noll-skott överföringsnoggrannhet.', 'ta': 'MBERT மற்றும் XLM- R போன்ற மொழி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகளுக்கு முன்பே பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது பூஜ்ஜியம் சுழற்சி மொழி மொழி மாற்றி குறைந்த வல However, limited model capability due to limited differences in available monolingual corpora size between high web- resource languages (HRL) and LRLs does not provide enough scope of joining the LRL with the HRL, thereby affecting the downstream task performance of LRLs. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் விவாதம் செய்து கொண்டிருக்கிறோம் மொழி குடும்பத்தில் மொழிகளில் உறவுப்புகள் உள்ளது என்று ஒரு மொழி குடும்பத்த BPE (OBPE) சுலபமான ஆனால் பயனுள்ள மாற்றுதல் BPE சொற்கோவை உருவாக்கும் கல்ஜிரிட்டம் அது தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளை மேல் மூடும். பல NLP பணிகள் மற்றும் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மூலம், OBPE ஒரு சொல்வளத்தை உருவாக்குகிறது அது HRLகளுடன் பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளும் குறியீடுகள் மூலம் LRLகளின் representation அதிகர This results in improved zero-shot transfer from related HRLs to LRLs without reducing HRL representation and accuracy.  முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் குறியீடு- மேல்மேற்பாட்டின் முக்கியத்தை விட்டுவிட்டது போல, குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழி அமைப்பில்,  பூஜ்ஜியத்தில் நான்கு மடங்கு குறைத்து பூஜ்ஜியத்திற்கு அதிகமாக பூஜ்ஜியத்தை மாற்றுவது சரியாக இருக்கும்.', 'so': 'Tusaalada luuqadaha luuqadaha kala duduwan ee horay loo tababaray, tusaale ahaan mBERT iyo XLM-R waxay muujiyeen suurtagal aad u badan in looga wareejiyo luuqadaha hoose ee internetka (LRL). Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sababtoo ah awoodda model ee aad u xaday, kala duwanaanshaha aad u weyn ee shirkadaha afka internetka (HRL) iyo LRLs (LRL) dhexdooda laguma siiyo sawir ku filan in la wadaajiyo LRL iyo HRL, taas darteed waxay saameyn ku yeelanayaan sameynta shaqada LRLs ee hoose socda. Warqadan waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa in xiriirka ku saabsan luqada qoyska luqada ah oo ku qoran daboolka leksikada waxaa laga yaabaa in la soo dhiibo in laga adkaado xuduudaha shirkadda ee LRLs. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa qoraalka afka BPE (OBPE) oo fudud oo weli faa’iido leh u beddelinta qoraalka farshaxanka BPE, kaas oo kordhiya ku qoran luuqadaha la xiriira. Imtixaan dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan shaqaalaha iyo macluumaadyada kala duduwan ee NLP, waxaynu fiirinnaa in OBPE sameeyaa hadal, kaas oo kordhiya muuqashada LRLs via calaamado lagu sharaxayo HRLs. Taas waxaa sababtay in la hagaajiyey bedelka looga wareejiyo HRLs-yada iyo LRLs-da, iyadoo aan la dhimin xuquuqda HRL iyo saxda. Waxbarashada hore oo kala duwan oo ay iska rideen muhiimka calaamada-overlap, waxaynu tusnaa in marka lagu qorayo afka hoose-resource-related, arrimaha calaamad-overlap. Inta la fududeeyo boolon wuxuu sababi karaa in la dhigo qiyaastii qiyaastii la wareejiyo nuur laab ah.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාවක් භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණය වගේ mBERT සහ XLM-R වලින් සුන්ධ භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන් සුන්ධ විශේෂ නමුත්, සීමාවිත මොඩල් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින්, ලොකු විසින් ප්\u200dරතිභාවිතයේ ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත භාෂාව (HRL) සහ LRLs ලොකු භාෂාව (HRL) අතර ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විසින් LRL මේ පත්තරේ අපි කතා කරනවා කියලා භාෂාවක් පවුලේ භාෂාවක් එක්ක සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ලෙක්සිකල් අවධානයක් ලෙක්සිකාල් අවධ අපි ඔවර්ලැප් BPE (OBPE) ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා, BPE ශබ්ද පරීක්ෂණය ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලට සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙ NLP වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩ සහ දත්ත සේට් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා OBPE කියලා ශබ්ධ වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒකෙන් LR මේක ප්\u200dරතිචාරය HRLs වලින් සම්බන්ධ HRL වලින් LRLs වලින් ශූන්ය ශූන්ය විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්නේ HRL ප්\u200dරත පිළිබඳ අධ්\u200dයානය වගේ අනතුරු විදිහට ටොකෙන් වර්ලැප් ගැන අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් නැති විදිහට, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක අඩුම සම්බ සුන්ධ විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සුන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සුන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සුන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සුන', 'ur': 'پہلے تعلیم کی ملتی زبان کی مدل جیسے mBERT اور XLM-R نے صفر-شٹ کرس-زبان ترافیس کے لئے بہت بڑی امکانات دکھائی ہے۔ However, due to limited model capacity, the large difference in the size of available monolingual corpora between high web-resource languages (HRL) and LRLs does not provide enough scope of co-embedding the LRL with the HRL, thereby affecting the downstream task performance of LRLs. اس کاغذ میں ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ زبانوں میں ایک زبان خاندان کی نسبت لکیسی اورلپ کے اندازے کے ساتھ لکیسی اورلپ کی نسبت زبانوں کی نسبت معاملہ کا ذریعہ ہے کہ LRL کے بعض کوپرا محدودیت پر غالب آئیں۔ ہم اورلپ BPE (OBPE) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، BPE لکھنے والی الگوریتم کے لئے ایک ساده اور اثر تغییر، جو مرتبہ زبانوں میں اورلپ کی زیادتی کرتا ہے۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ OBPE ایک لکھی آزمائش پیدا کرتا ہے جو LRLs کی نمایش کو HRLs کے ساتھ شریک ٹوکنوں کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرتا ہے. اس کا نتیجہ ہے کہ ارتباط کے HRLs سے LRLs کی طرف سے صفر-شٹ ترنسفور کو عمدہ کر دیا گیا ہے اور HRL نمایش اور دقیق کو کم کرنے کے بغیر. اگلے مطالعہ کے مطالعہ سے جو ٹوکنا اورلپ کے اہم اہل کو منع کرتی ہیں، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کم منبع کے ارتباط کی زبان تنظیمات میں، ٹوکنا اورلپ مسائل میں ہے. سینٹیٹی طور پر اورلپ کو صفر تک کم کر سکتا ہے کہ صفر-شٹ ٹرنسٹر دقیق میں چار دفعہ ڈوب سکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Lekin modelning chegarasi sababi, yuqori veb- resource tillarining (HRL) va LRLs (LRL) oʻrtadagi manbalar oʻlchamidagi katta oʻlchami boʻlishi mumkin. Bunday sabab, LRL'ni HRL bilan birga birlashtirishga yetarli holatni bermaydi. Bu qogʻozda biz tilning oilida bog'liq o'ylab kelishimiz mumkin, Leksikal qopchilikning bir necha qo'shilgan LRLning chegaralarini oshirish mumkin. Biz BPE (OBPE) haqida o'zgarishni tahlil qilamiz, bu bir oddiy va foydalanuvchi BPE tilning algoritga o'zgarishni o'zgartiradi. Bu tilda bogʻ'liq tillar bilan yuklashni oshirish mumkin. @ info Name @ info: whatsthis Koʻpburchakni nuqta kamaytirish natijasida nuqta koʻpaytirish imkoniyatini sababchi boʻlishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Những mô- đun ngôn ngữ đa dạng được đào tạo trước, như mBERT và XLM-R đã chứng minh tiềm năng lớn cho việc truyền qua ngôn ngữ nhỏ bằng không ảnh (LR). Tuy nhiên, nhờ khả năng mô hình giới hạn, sự khác biệt lớn về kích thước của một cá thể ngôn ngữ đa dạng giữa các ngôn ngữ đa nguồn Mạng cao (HRL) và LMS không cung cấp đủ phạm vi để cộng lắp đặt nó với HRL, nhờ đó ảnh hưởng tới hiệu suất làm việc Nhiệm vụ dưới của LAL. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi cho rằng liên quan giữa các ngôn ngữ trong một gia đình ngôn ngữ dọc theo chiều hướng của sự gấp bội ngôn ngữ có thể được tăng giá trị để vượt qua một số giới hạn tập thể của địa chấn. Chúng tôi đề nghị Overlap BPE, một sự sửa đổi đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả cho thuật to án sản xuất từ vựng thể hình khi tăng cường sự chồng chéo qua các ngôn ngữ liên quan. Qua các thí nghiệm rộng rãi trên nhiều công việc và các tập tin gia truyền, chúng tôi quan sát rằng OPP tạo ra một từ điển nâng cao sự đại diện của LAL thông qua các thẻ được chia sẻ với HRL. Kết quả là khả năng truyền tải bằng bắn không khỏi các loại công ty giải thích trực thăng (HRL) không giảm đại diện và độ chính xác. Không giống những nghiên cứu trước đã bác bỏ tầm quan trọng của việc tượng-đan, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng trong thiết lập ngôn ngữ phụ thuộc vào ít tài nguyên, có xu hướng chéo nhau. Giảm tổng hợp độ gấp đôi không có thể gây ra sự chính xác chuyển nhượng không bắn.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените многоезични езикови модели като mBERT и XLM-R демонстрират голям потенциал за нулев междуезичен трансфер към езици с ниски уеб ресурси (LRL). Поради ограничения капацитет на моделите обаче голямата разлика в размера на наличните едноезични корпуси между езиците с висок уеб ресурс (HRL) и LRL не предоставя достатъчно възможности за съвместно интегриране на LRL с HRL, като по този начин засяга изпълнението на задачите надолу по веригата на LRL. В тази статия ние твърдим, че връзката между езиците в езиково семейство по отношение на измерението на лексикалното припокриване може да бъде използвана за преодоляване на някои от корпоративните ограничения на ЛРЛ. Предлагаме опростена, но ефективна модификация на алгоритъма за генериране на лексика, която подобрява припокриването между сродните езици. Чрез обширни експерименти върху множество задачи и набори от данни, наблюдаваме, че генерира речник, който увеличава представянето на ЛРЛ чрез токени, споделени с ЛРЛ. Това води до подобрено пренасяне на нулеви изстрели от свързани ХРЛ към ХРЛ, без да намалява представянето и точността на ХРЛ. За разлика от предишни проучвания, които отхвърлиха значението на припокриването на символи, ние показваме, че в езиковата настройка, свързана с ниски ресурси, припокриването на символи има значение. Синтетично намаляване на припокриването до нула може да доведе до четирикратен спад в точността на прехвърляне на нулев изстрел.', 'da': "Forududdannede flersprogede sprogmodeller som mBERT og XLM-R har vist et stort potentiale for nul-shot tværsproget overførsel til lav webressource sprog (LRL). På grund af begrænset modelkapacitet giver den store forskel i størrelsen af tilgængelige ensprogede korpora mellem høj webressource sprog (HRL) og LRL'er imidlertid ikke tilstrækkelig mulighed for at integrere LRL'en sammen med HRL'en, hvilket påvirker LRL'ernes ydeevne i efterfølgende strøm. I denne artikel argumenterer vi for, at forhold mellem sprog i en sprogfamilie langs dimensionen af leksikalsk overlapning kan udnyttes til at overvinde nogle af de corpora begrænsninger af LRL. Vi foreslår Overlap BPE (OBPE), en enkel, men effektiv ændring af BPE ordforråd generation algoritme, der forbedrer overlapning på tværs af relaterede sprog. Gennem omfattende eksperimenter med flere NLP-opgaver og datasæt observerer vi, at OBPE genererer et ordforråd, der øger repræsentationen af LRL'er via tokens delt med HRL'er. Dette resulterer i forbedret zero-shot overførsel fra relaterede HRL til LRL uden at reducere HRL repræsentation og nøjagtighed. I modsætning til tidligere undersøgelser, der afviste betydningen af token-overlapning, viser vi, at i den lave ressourcerelaterede sprogindstilling, token overlapper ting. Syntetisk reduktion af overlapningen til nul kan medføre så meget som et firedobbelt fald i nul-skud overførsel nøjagtighed.", 'nl': "Vooropgeleide meertalige taalmodellen zoals mBERT en XLM-R hebben een groot potentieel aangetoond voor zero-shot cross-lingual transfer naar low web resource languages (LRL). Vanwege de beperkte modelcapaciteit biedt het grote verschil in de grootte van beschikbare eentalige corpora tussen hoge web-resource talen (HRL) en LRL's echter niet voldoende ruimte om de LRL samen met de HRL te integreren, waardoor de downstream taakprestaties van LRL's worden beïnvloed. In dit artikel stellen we dat verwantschap tussen talen in een taalfamilie langs de dimensie van lexicale overlap kan worden gebruikt om sommige corpora beperkingen van LRL's te overwinnen. We stellen Overlap BPE (OBPE) voor, een eenvoudige maar effectieve wijziging van het BPE vocabulaire generatie algoritme dat overlap tussen verwante talen verbetert. Door uitgebreide experimenten met meerdere NLP taken en datasets, zien we dat OBPE een woordenschat genereert die de representatie van LRL's verhoogt via tokens gedeeld met HRL's. Dit resulteert in een verbeterde zero-shot overdracht van verwante HRL's naar LRL's zonder dat HRL representatie en nauwkeurigheid wordt verminderd. In tegenstelling tot eerdere studies die het belang van token-overlap afwijzen, tonen we aan dat in de taalinstelling met weinig middelen, token-overlap belangrijk is. Synthetisch reduceren van de overlapping tot nul kan tot een viervoudige daling van de zero-shot overdracht nauwkeurigheid veroorzaken.", 'hr': 'Prije obučenih multijezičkih modela poput mBERT i XLM-R pokazali su veliki potencijal za prebacivanje nula-pogođenog cross-jezika na niske jezike web-resursa (LRL). Međutim, zbog ograničenog modelskog kapaciteta, velika razlika u veličini dostupnog monojezičkog korporacije između visokih jezika web-resursa (HRL) i LRL-a ne pruža dovoljno opsega zajedničkog uključenja LRL-a s HRL-om, tako utjecajući na sledeće funkcije LRL-a. U ovom papiru tvrdimo da povezanost među jezicima u jezičkoj obitelji duž dimenzije leksičkog preklapanja može biti utjecana na prevladavanje nekih ograničenja tijela LRL-a. Predlažemo preoklapanje BPE (OBPE), jednostavnu, ali efikasnu modifikaciju algoritma proizvodnje riječnika BPE-a koja povećava preoklapanje na svim odnosim jezicima. Kroz široke eksperimente o višestrukim zadatkima i setima podataka, posmatramo da OBPE stvara riječnik koji povećava zastupanje LRL-a putem znakova podijeljenih s HRL-ima. To je rezultat poboljšavanja prijenosa nule pucnjave iz povezanih HRL-a na LRL-e bez smanjenja predstavljanja HRL-a i preciznosti. Za razliku od prethodnih ispitivanja koji su odbacili važnost preklapanja znakova, pokazujemo da u nastavku jezika povezanih s niskim resursima znakovi prelapaju pitanja. Sintetično smanjenje preklapanja na nulu može uzrokovati četiri puta pad to čnosti prijenosa nula.', 'de': 'Vorgeschulte mehrsprachige Sprachmodelle wie mBERT und XLM-R haben ein großes Potenzial für den Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Low Web-Resource Languages (LRL) gezeigt. Aufgrund der begrenzten Modellkapazität bietet der große Unterschied in den Größen der verfügbaren monolingualen Korpora zwischen High Web Resource Languages (HRL) und LRLs jedoch nicht genügend Spielraum für die Co-Einbettung der LRL mit der HRL, wodurch die nachgelagerte Aufgabenleistung von LRLs beeinträchtigt wird. In diesem Beitrag argumentieren wir, dass die Verwandtschaft zwischen Sprachen in einer Sprachfamilie entlang der Dimension lexikalischer Überlappung genutzt werden kann, um einige der Korpora-Einschränkungen von LRLs zu überwinden. Wir schlagen Overlap BPE (OBPE) vor, eine einfache aber effektive Änderung des BPE Vokabelgenerierungsalgorithmus, der die Überlappung zwischen verwandten Sprachen verbessert. Durch umfangreiche Experimente an mehreren NLP-Aufgaben und Datensätzen beobachten wir, dass OBPE ein Vokabular generiert, das die Repräsentation von LRLs über Token erhöht, die mit HRLs geteilt werden. Dies führt zu einer verbesserten Nullschuss-Übertragung von verwandten HRLs zu LRLs, ohne die HRL-Darstellung und Genauigkeit zu beeinträchtigen. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Studien, die die Bedeutung von Token-Überlappung ablehnten, zeigen wir, dass Token-Überlappung in der ressourcenarmen Spracheinstellung von Bedeutung ist. Die synthetische Reduktion der Überlappung auf Null kann zu einem vierfachen Rückgang der Nullschuss-Übertragungsgenauigkeit führen.', 'id': 'Model bahasa berbagai bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya seperti mBERT dan XLM-R telah menunjukkan potensi besar untuk transfer bahasa-bahasa yang tidak ditembak nol ke bahasa-sumber web yang rendah (LRL). Namun, karena kapasitas model terbatas, perbedaan besar dalam ukuran corpora monobahasa yang tersedia antara bahasa sumber daya web tinggi (HRL) dan LRL tidak menyediakan jangkauan yang cukup untuk menggabungkan LRL dengan HRL, sehingga mempengaruhi prestasi tugas turun dari LRL. Dalam kertas ini, kita berdebat bahwa hubungan antara bahasa dalam sebuah keluarga bahasa sepanjang dimensi dari saling meliputi lexik mungkin digunakan untuk mengatasi beberapa batasan corpora LRL. Kami mengusulkan Overlap BPE (OBPE), modifikasi sederhana namun efektif pada algoritma generasi vokal BPE yang meningkatkan overlap di dalam bahasa terkait. Melalui eksperimen ekstensif pada beberapa tugas dan set data NLP, kami memperhatikan bahwa OBPE menghasilkan sebuah vocabulari yang meningkatkan perwakilan LRL melalui token berbagi dengan HRL. Ini menghasilkan pemindahan 0-shot dari HRL terkait ke LRL tanpa mengurangi repræsentasi dan akurasi HRL. Tidak seperti studi sebelumnya yang menolak penting token-overlap, kami menunjukkan bahwa dalam pengaturan bahasa yang berkaitan dengan sumber daya rendah, token overlap masalah. Secara sintetis mengurangi overlap ke nol dapat menyebabkan sebanyak empat kali turun dalam akurasi transfer 0-shot.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha za lugha zilizofundishwa kabla kama mBERT na XLM-R wameonyesha uwezekano mkubwa wa kuhamisha lugha za asili zisizo na sifuri kwenda lugha za chini za rasilimali za mtandaoni (LRL). Hata hivyo, kwa sababu ya uwezo mdogo wa mifano, tofauti kubwa katika ukubwa wa makampuni yanayopatikana kwa lugha za kimapenzi kati ya lugha za juu za rasilimali za mtandaoni (HRL) na LRL hazina uwezo wa kutosha ushirikiano wa LRL na HRL, kwa hiyo inaathiri ufanisi wa kazi za LRL za chini. Katika karatasi hii, tunahoji kuwa uhusiano kati ya lugha kwa familia ya lugha pamoja na ukubwa wa vifaa vya lexico unaweza kutumika ili kushinda baadhi ya mipaka ya makampuni ya LRL. Tunazipendekeza Overlap BPE (OBPE), ambayo ni rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi wa mabadiliko ya uzalishaji wa maneno ya BPE ambayo inaongezea upana katika lugha zinazohusiana na BPE. Kwa kupitia majaribio mengi kuhusu kazi mbalimbali za NLP na seti za data, tunaona kwamba OBPE inatengeneza lugha inayoongezea uwakilishi wa LRLs kupitia alama zilizosambazwa na HRLs. Matokeo haya yalisababisha kuboresha uhamishaji usio na sifa kutoka kwenye mashirika yanayohusiana na RLs hadi LRL bila kupunguza uwakilishi na uhakika wa HRL. Tofauti na tafiti zilizopita ambazo ziliondoa umuhimu wa kuweka alama, tunaonyesha kwamba katika mazingira ya lugha inayohusiana na rasilimali chini ya rasilimali, mambo yanayozidi kupungua. Kiunganisha kupunguza upande wa juu hadi sifuri unaweza kusababisha kiasi cha kupungua kwa mara nne katika uhakika wa usafirishaji wa risasi sifuri.', 'ko': '예를 들어 mBERT와 XLM-R 등 사전에 훈련된 다중 언어 모델은 제로 크로스 언어가 낮은 네트워크 자원 언어(LRL)로 이전하는 거대한 잠재력을 증명했다.그러나 모델의 용량이 제한되어 있어 높은 웹 자원 언어(HRL)와 LRL 사이에 사용할 수 있는 단어 자료 라이브러리의 크기 차이가 매우 커서 LRL과 HRL을 함께 삽입할 수 있는 충분한 범위를 제공하지 못해 LRL의 하위 작업 성능에 영향을 미친다.본고에서 우리는 한 어족 중의 언어 간의 어휘 중첩 차원에서의 연관성은 LRL의 일부 어료 라이브러리의 제한을 극복할 수 있다고 생각한다.우리는 BPE(OBPE) 중첩을 제기했다. 이것은 BPE 어휘표 생성 알고리즘에 대한 간단하고 효과적인 수정으로 관련 언어 간의 중첩을 강화했다.여러 NLP 작업과 데이터 세트에 대한 많은 실험을 통해 OBPE가 생성한 어휘표가 HRL과 공유된 태그를 통해 LRL의 표현을 증가시키는 것을 관찰했다.이렇게 하면 연관된 HRL에서 LRL로의 제로 포 전송이 향상되며 HRL 표현과 정확성이 저하되지 않습니다.이전의 연구에서 대명사 중첩의 중요성을 중시하지 않았던 것과 달리 우리는 자원과 관련된 정도가 비교적 낮은 언어 환경에서 대명사 중첩이 매우 중요하다는 것을 발견했다.종합적으로 0까지 중첩을 줄이면 영사 전이 정밀도가 4배로 떨어질 수 있다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای پیش آموزش یافته\u200cای مانند mBERT و XLM-R برای انتقال کردن زبان\u200cهای متوسط زبان\u200cهای صفر (LRL) به زبان\u200cهای کم منابع\u200cهای وب (WBERT) نشان داده\u200cاند. ولی به دلیل توانایی مدل محدودیت، تفاوت بزرگی در اندازه\u200cهای شرکت تنها زبان موجود بین زبان\u200cهای منابع\u200cهای وب بالا (HRL) و LRL به اندازه کافی از شرکت LRL با HRL نمی\u200cدهد، بنابراین تأثیر اجرای کار پایین LRL را تأثیر نمی\u200cدهد. در این کاغذ، ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که ارتباط بین زبان\u200cها در خانواده زبان در طول اندازه\u200cای از تغییرات زبانی ممکن است برای تغییر برخی از محدودیت زبان\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای زبان\u200cها تأثیر دهد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که "Overlap BPE" (OBPE)، یک تغییر ساده و تاثیر موثر برای الگوریتم نسل vocabulary BPE که در زبان\u200cهای ارتباطی بیشتر است. از طریق آزمایش های گسترده روی کار های زیادی NLP و مجموعه داده ها، مشاهده می کنیم که OBPE یک کلمهای ایجاد می کند که نمایش LRLs را با نشانه های مشترک با HRLs افزایش می دهد. این نتیجه به انتقال صفر از HRL رابطه به LRL، بدون کاهش نمایش و دقیق HRL، بهتر شد. برخلاف مطالعه های قبلی که مهمترین تغییر تغییر نشان داده اند، ما نشان می دهیم که در تنظیم زبان های کم منبع، مسائل تغییر تغییر نشان می دهند. سنتئاتیک کاهش افزایش به صفر می\u200cتواند به اندازه چهار بار افزایش دقیق انتقال صفر دقیق باشد.', 'tr': "MBERT we XLM-R 첵aly 철흫체ndeki bilim g철rn체힊leri, 0-atly 챌arpakly diller 체챌in i흫 d체힊체k web resurslar dili (LRL) 체챌in uly m체mkin챌ilik g철rkezildi. 횦철ne, nusgalan ukyplary흫 체챌in, bar monodil korporaty흫 첵okary web-resurslar dili (HRL) we LRL dillerini흫 arasynda 첵eterlik sowgady HRL bilen birle힊dirmek 체챌in 첵eterlik sowgady d채l, 힊ol seb채bi LRL-i흫 a힊ak t채sirini etm채ge et첵채r. Bu kagyzda, biz dilleri흫 bir ma힊galasynda leksi첵aly du힊u힊ygy흫 철l챌체si 첵anynda, LRL k철p체si limitlerini흫 birn채챌esini 체stden 챌ykarmak 체챌in t채sirle힊er. Biz BPE (OBPE) s철zleri흫 체stine ge챌mesini a 흫satjag we efektli bir 체첵tgewi힊ini teklip edip g철r첵채ris. 횉oklu NLP i힊i we veri setirleri 체zerinde 철r채n 챌철pl체 deneyler bilen, OBPE'i흫 HRL bilen payla힊캇lan tokenler bilen LRL d철redigini 체첵tged첵채n s철zleri d철redip g철r체n첵채rdik. Bu n채me 체챌in HRL d철wletlerini we dogrudygyny azaltmadyk HRL tarapyndan LRL tarapyna 0 atly aktarmasyny geli힊tirdi. 횜흫ki tapy힊mak 체챌in n채hili m철h체mmetini bo힊andyran 철흫ki i힊lemleri흫 첵aly, g체rr체흫leri흫 d체힊체k derejesinde s철zleri tapyl첵andygyny g철rkez첵채ris. Senetik gabdalygy nula eksiltmek 체챌in d철rt katly ga첵힊artmak 체챌in 0-aty ta첵첵arlamasyny흫 dogrylygyna sebep edip biler.", 'af': "Vorige onderwerp multitaal modele soos mBERT en XLM-R het groot potensiaal vir nul-skoot kruistaal oordrag na lae web-hulpbron tale (LRL) bevestig. Die groot verskil in die grootte van beskikbaar monolinglike korpora tussen hoë web-hulpbron tale (HRL) en LRL verskaf nie genoeg skoop van die LRL wat saamgevoer word met die HRL nie, daarom het die onderstreem taak uitwerking van LRL aangewend. In hierdie papier het ons gespreek dat die verwantigheid onder tale in 'n taal familie langs die dimensie van leksiese oorvloei kan wees aangewend om sommige van die korpore beperkings van LRL te oorwin. Ons voorstel oorvloei BPE (OBPE), â\x80\x99n eenvoudig nog effektief verandering aan die BPE woordeboek generasie algoritme wat oorvloei verbeter oor verwante tale. Deur uitbreidige eksperimente op veelvuldige NLP opdragte en datastelle, ons observeer dat OBPE genereer 'n woordeboek wat die voorstelling van LRLs verhoog deur tokens wat deel met HRLs. Hierdie resultaat het in verbeterde nulskoot oordrag van verwante HRLs na LRLs sonder om HRL voorstelling en presisiteit te reduseer. Ongelyks soos vorige studie wat die belangrikheid van token-oorvloei verlaat het, wys ons dat in die lae-hulpbronne verwante taal instelling, die token oorvloei saake. Sintetiese verduur die oorvloei na nul kan veroorsaak soos 'n vier maal val in nulskoot oorvloediging presies.", 'sq': 'Modelet e paratrajnuara të gjuhëve shumëgjuhësore të tilla si mBERT dhe XLM-R kanë demonstruar potencial të madh për transferimin e gjuhëve me zero-shot në gjuhët me burime të ulëta në internet (LRL). Megjithatë, për shkak të kapacitetit të kufizuar të modelit, dallimi i madh në madhësitë e korprave monogjuhësore të disponueshme midis gjuhëve të larta të burimeve të internetit (HRL) dhe LRL nuk ofron fushë të mjaftueshme për bashkëpunimin e LRL me HRL, duke prekur kështu performancën e detyrës së poshtme të LRL. Në këtë letër, argumentojmë se lidhjet midis gjuhëve në një familje gjuhësh përgjatë dimensionit të mbishtypjes lexike mund të përdoren për të kapërcyer disa nga kufizimet e korprës të LRL-ve. Ne propozojmë Overlap BPE (OBPE), një modifikim i thjeshtë por efektiv në algoritmin e gjeneratës së fjalorëve BPE që përmirëson mbikalimin në gjuhët e lidhura. Nëpërmjet eksperimenteve të gjerë në detyra të shumta NLP dhe të dhënave, ne vëzhgojmë se OBPE gjeneron një fjalor që rrit përfaqësimin e LRLs nëpërmjet tokens të ndara me HRLs. This results in improved zero-shot transfer from related HRLs to LRLs without reducing HRL representation and accuracy.  Në ndryshim nga studimet e mëparshme që e hodhën poshtë rëndësinë e mbishtypjes së token, ne tregojmë se në rregullimin e gjuhës me burime të ulëta, token mbishtypjen çështje. Reduktimi sintetik i mbishtypjes në zero mund të shkaktojë sa një rënie katër herë në saktësinë e transferit zero-shot.', 'am': 'MBERT እና XLM-R እንደምትሆን የፊተኛውን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ወደ ታችኛው የዌብ-resource ቋንቋ መዘዋወር (LRL) የተመሳሳይ የክፍለ ክፍል ስልጣን በክፍል ያስችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ በተለየ ሞዴል ስልጣን ምክንያት፣ የበይነ መረብ-resource ቋንቋዎች (HRL) እና LRL (LRL) መካከል በተለየ ትልቁ የኮርፖርት ክፍተት በኩል፣ ከዚህም በኋላ የLRL አድራጊያውን በመጠቀም የሚያስፈልገውን አካባቢ አያደርግም፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የቋንቋ ቤተሰቦች የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ግንኙነት ከሌክሲካዊ ጉዳይ የLRL ግንኙነቶችን ለማሸንፍ ይችላል ብለን እናዋጋለን፡፡ BPE (OBPE) በተለየ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የሚጨምረው የBPE ቃላት አሌጎርቲም የሚለውጥ ቀላል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በNLP አድራጊዎች እና ዳታተሮች ላይ በብዙ ፈተናዎች ውስጥ OBPE ከHRLs ጋር በተለየ ምልክቶች የሚያበዛውን የLRLs መልዕክት እንዲያበዛ እናየዋለን፡፡ ይህም አዲስ HRL ን ከማንበብ እና እርግጠኛ ሳያጎድል ከቅርብ HRLs ወደ LRLs በመለወጥ በ0-shot ክፈት ያሳድጋል፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት የምልክት ማቀናቀፍ ግንኙነቱን በማሳየት አይተካከሉም፣ በክፍለ ሀብት በተገኘው ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በክፍተት ላይ ክፈት ወደ 0 ማሳየት በአራት እጥፍ ጥፍት በzero-shot ተለውጦ እርግጠኛ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված բազմալեզվով լեզվի մոդելները, ինչպիսիք են mBER-ը և XLM-R-ը, ցույց են տալիս մեծ պոտենցիալ զրոյի միջլեզվի փոխանցման դեպի ցածր վեբ ռեսուրսների լեզուներ (LRL). Այնուամենայնիվ, սահմանափակ մոդելների հնարավորության պատճառով, հասանելի միալեզվով կորպորայի չափերի մեծ տարբերությունը բարձր վեբ-ռեսուրսների լեզուների (HRL) և LRL-ների միջև բավարար տարածք չի տրամադրում LRL-ի հետ միասին ներգրավելու համար, ինչը ազդում է LRL-ների առաջնային գործողություններին Այս թղթի մեջ մենք պնդում ենք, որ լեզվի ընտանիքի լեզվի միջև կապը լեքսիկական կապվածության չափերի երկայնքով կարող է օգտագործվել LRL-ների որոշ մարմնի սահմանափակումների հաղթահարելու համար: We propose Overlap BPE (OBPE), a simple yet effective modification to the BPE vocabulary generation algorithm which enhances overlap across related languages.  ՆԼՊ-ի բազմաթիվ խնդիրների և տվյալների համակարգերի բազմաթիվ փորձարկումների միջոցով մենք նկատում ենք, որ ՕԲԷ ստեղծում է բառարան, որը բարձրացնում է LRL-ների ներկայացումը HRL-ների հետ կիսվող նշանների միջոցով: Սա հանգեցնում է զրոյական կրակի փոխանցման կապված ՀՌԼ-ներից LRL-ներին առանց նվազեցնելու ՀՌL-ի ներկայացումը և ճշգրտությունը: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ ուսումնասիրություններին, որոնք արգելափակեցին նշանների կապվածության կարևորությունը, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ցածր ռեսուրսներով կապված լեզվի միջավայրում նշաններ կապվածության կարևորությունը Սինթետիկ նվազեցնելը վերածմանը զրոյի կարող է պատճառ տալ մինչև չորս անգամ նվազեցնել զրոյի փոխանցման ճշգրտությունը:', 'bs': 'Pre-obučeni multijezički modeli poput mBERT i XLM-R pokazali su veliki potencijal za prebacivanje nula pogođenog preko jezika na niske jezike mrežnih resursa (LRL). Međutim, zbog ograničenog modelnog kapaciteta, velika razlika u veličini dostupnog monojezičkog korporacije između visokih jezika web-resursa (HRL) i LRL ne pruža dovoljno opsega zajednostavljanja LRL-a sa HRL-om, tako da utječe na sledeće funkcije LRL-a. U ovom papiru tvrdimo da povezanost među jezicima u jezičkoj porodici duž dimenzije leksičkog preklapanja može biti uticajena na prevladanje nekih ograničenja tijela LRL-a. Predlažemo da preoklapamo BPE (OBPE), jednostavnu, ali efikasnu modifikaciju algoritma generacije riječnika BPE-a koja povećava preoklapanje na povezanim jezicima. Kroz široke eksperimente o višestrukim NLP zadacima i setima podataka, posmatramo da OBPE stvara rečnik koji povećava predstavljanje LRL-a putem znakova podijeljenih sa HRL-ima. To je rezultat poboljšanog prebacivanja nule snimke iz povezanih HRL-a na LRL-e bez smanjenja predstavljanja HRL-a i preciznosti. Za razliku od prethodnih ispitivanja koji su odbacili važnost preklapanja znakova, pokazujemo da u nastavku jezika povezanih s niskim resursima znakovi prelapaju pitanja. Sintetično smanjenje preklapanja na nulu može uzrokovati koliko četiri puta pad tačnosti premještaja nula.', 'bn': 'পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মাল্টিভাষার মডেল, যেমন mBERT এবং XLM-R, শুধুমাত্র শুট ক্রস-ভাষায় নিম্ন ওয়েব-রিসোর্স ভাষায় প্রবেশ করার জন্য বিশাল সম্ভাবনা প তবে মডেলের সীমিত ক্ষমতার কারণে হাই ওয়েব-রিসোর্স ভাষা (এইচআরএল) এবং এলআরএল এর মধ্যে বিশাল পার্থক্যের মাধ্যমে প্রাপ্ত মোনোলিভাল কোর্পোরা (এইচআরএল) এবং এলআরএল এর মধ্যে যথেষ্ট স্কোপ এইচআরএল এর In this paper, we argue that relatedness among languages in a language family along the dimension of lexical overlap may be leveraged to overcome some of the corpora limitations of LRLs.  আমরা ওভারল্যাপ বিপেক (ওবেপে) প্রস্তাব করছি, বিপের শব্দভাণ্ডারের প্রজন্ম আলোগোরিদমের জন্য একটি সহজ কার্যকর পরিবর্তন, যা সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষ বিশেষ পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখি যে OBPE একটি শব্দভাণ্ডার তৈরি করে যা এইচআরএল এর সাথে শেয়ার করা চিহ্নের মাধ্যমে LRLs প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব বৃদ্ধি করে। এর ফলে এইচআরএল প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং সঠিকভাবে কমিয়ে দেয়া ছাড়াই সংশ্লিষ্ট এইচআরএল থেকে এলআরএল পর্যন্ত শূন্য-গুলি পরিবর্তনের কারণে  পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণাগুলোর প্রধান বিচ্ছিন্ন করা যায়, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কম সম্পদের সাথে সম্পর্কিত ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে প্রম সাধারণিকভাবে শূন্য পর্যন্ত আবর্জনা কমিয়ে দিতে পারে যে শুধুমাত্র শুট পরিবর্তনের সঠিকভাবে চারগুণ ফ্ল্যান্ড ড ডাক', 'az': "MBERT və XLM-R kimi əvvəl təhsil edilmiş çoxlu dil modelləri sıfır dilləri ilə düşük web-resursu dillərinə (LRL) göndərdilər. Lakin, modellərin səviyyəsinə görə, yüksək web-resource dillərin (HRL) və LRL dillərin arasındakı mövcud monodil korporasının böyüklüyü HRL ilə LRL'i birləşdirmək üçün kifayət mümkün deyildir, bununla LRL'lərin aşağı iş performansını etmişdir. Bu kağızda, dil ailəsindəki dillərin arasındakı bağlılığı LRL'lərin bəzi korpora limitlərinin üstünə gəlməsini istəyirik. Biz BPE sözlərinin üstünlüyünü artıran algoritimin basit, hətta etkili bir dəyişiklik təklif edirik. Çoxlu NLP işləri və veri quruları barəsində geniş təcrübələr vasitəsilə, OBPE'nin HRL ilə paylaşılan möcüzələr vasitəsilə LRL'lərin göstərilməsini artıran sözləri yaratdığını görürük. Bu, HRL göstəricisini və doğruluğunu azaltmadan, bağlı HRL-lərdən LRL-lərə sıfır-fəst tərəfindən yüksəltməyə başladı. Əvvəlki öyrənmələr kimi, token-overlap vacibətini tərk edir, biz buna baxmayacağımızı göstəririk ki, düşük kaynaqlar haqqındakı dil ayarlarında, token məsələlərinin üstünə gəlir. Sintetik sıfərə düşürmək səfərə dörd dəfə səfərə düşürmək olar.", 'cs': 'Předškolené vícejazyčné jazykové modely, jako jsou mBERT a XLM-R, prokázaly velký potenciál pro nulový přenos mezi jazyky do jazyků s nízkými webovými zdroji (LRL). Vzhledem k omezené kapacitě modelu však velký rozdíl ve velikostech dostupných jednojjazyčných korpusů mezi jazyky s vysokými webovými zdroji (HRL) a LRL neposkytuje dostatečný rozsah pro společné vložení LRL s HRL, čímž ovlivňuje výkon následných úkolů LRL. V tomto článku argumentujeme, že souvislost mezi jazyky v jazykové rodině podél dimenze lexikálního překrývání může být využita k překonání některých omezení korpusů LRL. Navrhujeme Overlap BPE (OBPE), jednoduchou, ale efektivní úpravu algoritmu generování slovní zásoby BPE, který zlepšuje překrývání mezi příbuznými jazyky. Prostřednictvím rozsáhlých experimentů na více NLP úlohách a datových sadách pozorujeme, že OBPE generuje slovní zásobu, která zvyšuje reprezentaci LRL prostřednictvím tokenů sdílených s HRL. To vede k lepšímu přenosu nulového výstřelu ze souvisejících HRL na LRL bez snížení reprezentace a přesnosti HRL. Na rozdíl od předchozích studií, které odmítly důležitost překrývání tokenů, ukazujeme, že v jazykovém nastavení s nízkými zdroji záleží na překrývání tokenů. Syntetické snížení překrytí na nulu může způsobit až čtyřnásobný pokles přesnosti přenosu nulového výstřelu.', 'et': 'Eelkoolitud mitmekeelsed keelemudelid, nagu mBERT ja XLM-R, on näidanud suurt potentsiaali nullkeelseks ülekandmiseks vähese veebiressurssiga keeltele (LRL). Mudelide piiratud mahutavuse tõttu ei anna suur erinevus olemasolevate ühekeelsete korpuste suuruses suurte veebiressurssidega keelte (HRL) ja LRL-ide vahel piisavalt ulatust LRL-i ja HRL-i kaaskaasamiseks, mõjutades seeläbi LRL-ide ülesannete täitmist järgmise etapi jooksul. Käesolevas dokumendis väidame, et keeleperekonna keelte seost leksikaalse kattumise mõõtmega võib kasutada, et ületada mõningaid korpuste piiranguid LRL. Pakume välja Overlap BPE (OBPE), lihtne, kuid efektiivne muudatus BPE sõnavara genereerimise algoritmi, mis suurendab kattumist seotud keelte vahel. Mitme NLP ülesande ja andmekogumi ulatuslike eksperimentide kaudu täheldame, et OBPE genereerib sõnavara, mis suurendab LRL-ide esindatust HRL-idega jagatud tokenite kaudu. Selle tulemuseks on parem null-shot ülekanne seotud HRL-idelt LRL-idele, vähendamata HRL-ide esitust ja täpsust. Erinevalt varasematest uuringutest, mis eirasid märkide kattumise tähtsust, näitame, et vähese ressursiga seotud keeleseadmetes on märkide kattuvus oluline. Sünteetiliselt kattumise vähendamine nullini võib põhjustada kuni neljakordse languse null-shot ülekande täpsuses.', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut monikieliset kielimallit, kuten mBERT ja XLM-R, ovat osoittaneet suurta potentiaalia nollakieliseen siirtymiseen vähävaraisiin verkkoresursseihin (LRL). Koska mallikapasiteetti on rajallinen, käytettävissä olevien monikielisten korpusten koon suuri ero korkean verkkoresurssin kielten (HRL) ja LRL:n välillä ei kuitenkaan tarjoa riittävästi mahdollisuuksia yhdistää LRL:tä HRL:ään, mikä vaikuttaa LRL:n loppupään tehtävien suorituskykyyn. Tässä artikkelissa väitämme, että kieliperheen kielten keskinäistä suhdetta lexikaalisen päällekkäisyyden ulottuvuuteen voidaan hyödyntää joidenkin LRL:n corpora-rajoitusten poistamiseksi. Ehdotamme Overlap BPE (OBPE), yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta muutosta BPE sanaston generointialgoritmiin, joka parantaa päällekkäisyyttä toisiinsa liittyvien kielten välillä. Useilla NLP-tehtävillä ja -aineistoilla tehtyjen laajojen kokeiden avulla havaitsemme, että OBPE tuottaa sanaston, joka lisää LRL:ien edustusta HRL:ien kanssa jaettujen tokenien kautta. Tämä johtaa parempaan nollalaukauksen siirtoon vastaavista HRL:istä LRL:iin heikentämättä HRL:n esitystä ja tarkkuutta. Toisin kuin aiemmat tutkimukset, joissa hylättiin token-päällekkäisyyden merkitys, osoitamme, että vähäresurssisessa kieliympäristössä token-päällekkäisyydellä on merkitystä. Synteettisesti päällekkäisyyden pienentäminen nollaan voi aiheuttaa jopa nelinkertaisen pudotuksen nollakuvan siirtotarkkuudessa.', 'ca': "Models de llenguatges multillengües preconformats com mBERT i XLM-R han demostrat un gran potencial de transfer ència de llenguatges transversals amb fotografies zero a llenguatges de baix recursos web (LRL). Tanmateix, degut a la capacitat de model limitada, la gran diferència en les dimensions del corpore monolingüe disponible entre les llengües de recursos web elevats (HRL) i les LRL no proporciona prou ample d'integració del LRL amb el HRL, afectant així el desempeny de les tasques avall dels LRL. En aquest paper, argumentem que la relació entre les llengües d'una família de llengües al llarg de la dimensió de la sobreposió lèxica pot ser utilitzada per superar algunes de les limitacions corporals dels LRL. Proposem Overlap BPE (OBPE), una modificació senzilla però efectiva a l'algoritme de generació de vocabulari BPE que millora la sobreposió entre llengües relacionades. A través d'extensos experiments en múltiples tasques i conjunts de dades de NLP, observem que OBPE genera un vocabulari que augmenta la representació de LRL mitjançant fitxes compartides amb HRL. Això resulta en una millora transfer ència de fotografies zero de LRL relacionats a LRL sense reduir la representació i la precisió de LRL. A diferència d'estudis anteriors que van rebutjar l'importància de la sobreposió de fitxes, demostram que en el contexte de llenguatges relacionats amb baixos recursos, les fitxes es sobreposen. La reducció sintètica de la sobreposió a zero pot provocar una descesa de quatre vegades de la precisió de transfer ència de tirs zero.", 'ha': "@ label: listbox A lokacin da aka ƙunsa da maɓallin motsi, mai girma cikin girma mai iya amfani da firma masu iya haɗi na nau'in-nau'in-bakin da ke tsakanin harshen masu tsakanin HRL (HRL) da LRLs bã ya ƙunsa da shirin ya haɗi LRL da HRL, kuma amma yana yi amfani da aikin LRLs na ƙarami. Daga wannan takardan, Munã jãyayya cẽwa, masu husũma da harsunan cikin birane da ke samun damƙar wa littafin leksisi, za'a iya samar da shi dõmin ya rinjãya sãshen marubũta na LRLs. Tuna goyyar da Surlap BPA (OBPA), mai sauƙi kuma mai amfani da gyare-gyare zuwa algoritm na danna-BLE, wanda yana ƙara rufe kowaci cikin lugha masu husũma. Ina ƙara cikin jarrabãwa masu yawa a kan aikin NLP da tsaro masu yawa, Munã gani cẽwa OBLE na ƙara wani sihiri wanda ke ƙara girmama LRLs da alama wanda aka share da HRLs. Wannan na ƙara ya gyãra transfer da sifo-shot daga masu hushi na HRLs zuwa LRLs kuma bai ƙara tsari da HRL ba. @ info: whatsthis Yana ƙara girmar da ke haɗuwa da shi zuwa sifiri, kan ya saba da gwargwadon da ɓacewa sau-biyu cikin tsarin wanda aka shige na sifiri.", 'he': 'דוגמני שפת רבות מאומנים מראש, כמו mBERT ו XLM-R, הראו פוטנציאל גדול להעברת שפת דרך אפס ללא צלילים לשפת רשת נמוכות (LRL). בכל אופן, בגלל יכולת מודל מוגבלת, ההבדל הגדול בגודלים של גופות מונושפות זמינות בין שפות משאבים רשתיים גבוהות (HRL) ו LRLs לא מספק ספק מספיק כדי לשתלב את LRL עם HRL, ולכן משפיע על ביצוע המשימה התחתון של LRLs. בעיתון הזה, אנו טוענים שקשורות בין שפות במשפחת שפות לאורך המימד של התקפות לקסית עלולה להתגבר על כמה מגבלות הקופורה של LRL. We propose Overlap BPE (OBPE), a simple yet effective modification to the BPE vocabulary generation algorithm which enhances overlap across related languages.  באמצעות ניסויים רחבים על משימות רבות של NLP ומערכות נתונים, אנו רואים כי OBPE יוצר מילון שמעלה את מייצג LRLs באמצעות סימנים משותפים עם HRLs. זה גורם להעברה אפס-ירי שיפור מ HRLs קשורים ל LRLs בלי להפחית מייצג HRL ודיוק. בניגוד למחקרים הקודמים שפיטרו את חשיבות התקפות של סימנים, אנו מראים שבסדר השפה הקשור למשאבים נמוכים, סימנים מתקפות עניינים. שינוי הסינטטי של הכפילה לאפס יכול לגרום למידה של 4 פעמים בדיקת העברה של אפס יריות.', 'sk': 'Predhodno usposobljeni večjezični jezikovni modeli, kot sta mBERT in XLM-R, so pokazali velik potencial za ničelni medjezični prenos v jezike z nizkimi spletnimi viri (LRL). Vendar zaradi omejene zmogljivosti modela velika razlika v velikosti razpoložljivih enojezičnih korpusov med jeziki z visokimi spletnimi viri (HRL) in LRL ne zagotavlja dovolj možnosti sočasne vključitve LRL z HRL, kar vpliva na uspešnost opravil LRL v nadaljnji verigi. V tem prispevku trdimo, da se lahko povezanost med jeziki v jezikovni družini vzdolž dimenzije leksikalnega prekrivanja izkoristi za premagovanje nekaterih omejitev korpusov LRL. Predlagamo Overlap BPE (OBPE), preprosto, a učinkovito spremembo algoritma za generiranje besedišča BPE, ki povečuje prekrivanje med sorodnimi jeziki. Z obsežnimi eksperimenti na več nalogah in naborih podatkov NLP ugotavljamo, da OBPE ustvari besedišče, ki povečuje zastopanost LRL prek žetonov, ki jih delijo HRL. Rezultat tega je izboljšan prenos ničelnega strela iz sorodnih HRL na LRL, ne da bi zmanjšali zastopanost HRL in natančnost. Za razliko od prejšnjih študij, ki so zavrnile pomen prekrivanja žetonov, kažemo, da je v jezikovni nastavitvi, povezani z nizkimi viri, pomembno prekrivanje žetonov. Sintetično zmanjšanje prekrivanja na nič lahko povzroči celo štirikratni padec natančnosti prenosa brez strela.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། mBERT དང XLM-R ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་zero-shot་cross-lingual transfer་ཡི་ནང་དུ་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐྱེས་འདྲེན་མཐ ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཚད་limitེ་ བྱས་ན་ཡིན་པའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཀྱི་ཚད་ཆེ་ཤིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚང་གཅིག་གི་ནང་གི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མཐུན་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚང་མས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་དབང་ ང་ཚོས་Overlap BPE (OBPE)ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། BPE vocabulary་འབྲི་ཚིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག NLP ལས་ཀ་དང་གནད་སྡུད་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྒེར་སྟངས་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་ང་ཚོས་OBPE ལ་བརྗོད་ཐོག་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང་མཁན་ལ་ཉེན་མཁན་དེ་ཡོད། འདིས་HRL དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་HRLs་ནས་ཉེན་རྟོགས་དང་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ཀླད་ཡོད་པའི་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་ནི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་རེད། སྔོན་གྱི་བརྗོད་ཟིན་བྱས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་token-overlap་གལ་ཆེ་བ་མེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དུ་འཇུ དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལྡོག་རིམ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཚད་དཀྱིས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་བཞི་རྡེབ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་དགོས་བྱུང་།', 'jv': 'model sing sampeyan karo akeh luwih-luwih dumaten, kaya mBERT karo XLM-R dumaten supoyo kapan kanggo nula-soko nggawe luwih bantuan kanggo langgambar web-source (LRL). politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pewiir iki, awak dhéwé sawasara awak dhéwé nglanggar luwih sabané karo alêh-luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe gerakan akeh bantuan liyane Awak dhéwé nggunakake Ato sampeyan akeh operasi sing nyengkuyung ing nggawe NLP karo akeh dadi, kéné ngerasai OBBE kang kelalaman sing nyimpen kelalaman sing wis dipenepakan LRLs seneng token karo HRLs. Ngomongke iki njaluk luwih-ngregani dipoleh nunggo-ngregani dipoleh karo HRLs barang nggo LRLs kuwi mau, nik kuwi nambah reparasi HRL lan dadi sing apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing beraksi kanggo ngerasakno pangan token text-tool-action'}
{'en': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'ar': 'نمذجة التسلسل بعيد المدى مع الانتباه المتفرق الذي يمكن التنبؤ به', 'pt': 'Modelagem de sequência de longo alcance com atenção esparsa previsível', 'es': 'Modelado de secuencias de largo alcance con poca atención predecible', 'fr': 'Modélisation de séquences à longue portée avec une attention limitée prévisible', 'ja': '予測可能なまばらな注意を伴う長距離シーケンスモデリング', 'zh': '有可占疏意远程序列建模', 'hi': 'अनुमानित विरल ध्यान के साथ लंबी दूरी के अनुक्रम मॉडलिंग', 'ru': 'Моделирование последовательности на большие расстояния с предсказуемым редким вниманием', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Seicheamh Fadraoin le Airde Gann Intuartha', 'ka': 'მარტივი განზომილებების მოდელირება დასაწყვებელი განზომილება', 'hu': 'Hosszú távú szekvencia modellezés előre látható ritka figyelemmel', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση ακολουθίας μεγάλης εμβέλειας με προβλέψιμη περιορισμένη προσοχή', 'it': 'Modellazione di sequenza a lungo raggio con attenzione scarsa prevedibile', 'lt': 'Ilgalaikio nuotolio sekos modeliavimas su prognozuojamu nedideliu dėmesiu', 'kk': 'Уақыт аумағының реттеу үлгісін алдындағы кеңістіктерді қарау', 'ms': 'Model Sekuensi Jarak Panjang dengan Perhatian Sederhana Dijangka', 'mt': 'Mudellar tas-Sekwenza fuq medda twila b’Attenzjoni Mhux Prevedibbli', 'ml': 'മുന്\u200dനിര്\u200dത്താവുന്ന സ്പെയിസ്സുമായി നീളമുള്ള ക്രമീകരണ മോഡലിങ്ങ്', 'mk': 'Моделирање на долга оддалеченост со предвидливо мало внимание', 'pl': 'Modelowanie sekwencji dalekiego zasięgu z przewidywalną rzadką uwagą', 'no': 'Modelling av langområde sekvens med forhåndsvisbare mellomrom', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн хэмжээний дарааллын загварын загвар', 'sr': 'Modeliranje određenih sekvencija dugog dometa sa predvidljivom pažnjom prostora', 'ro': 'Modelarea secvenţelor pe rază lungă cu atenţie slabă previzibilă', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් ස්පාර්ස් අවධානය සඳහා ලොකු සීමාව ප්\u200dරමාණය', 'sv': 'Långdistanssekvensmodellering med förutsägbar sparsam uppmärksamhet', 'ta': 'முன்னிலைப்படுத்தக்கூடிய வினாட்டு கவனத்துடன் நீண்ட விதிமுறை மாறுதல்', 'so': 'Long-range Sequence Modeling with Predictable Sparse Attention', 'ur': 'لانگ رنج سکوئنس موڈلینگ کی پیش بینی جگہ حفاظت کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ dãy nhanh dài có khả năng đoán trước', 'bg': 'Моделиране на последователност на дълги разстояния с предвидимо оскъдно внимание', 'nl': 'Sequentiemodellering op lange afstand met voorspelbare spaarzame aandacht', 'hr': 'Modeliranje određene sekvence dugog raspona s predviđenom pozornošću', 'da': 'Langtrækkende sekvensmodellering med forudsigelig sparsom opmærksomhed', 'id': 'Long-range Sequence Modeling with Predictable Sparse Attention', 'de': 'Long-Range Sequence Modeling mit vorhersagbarer Sparse Aufmerksamkeit', 'fa': 'مدل سطح طولانی با توجه قابل پیش بینی', 'ko': '예측 가능한 희소 주의가 있는 장거리 서열 모델링', 'sw': 'Uzungumzaji wa mrefu na Uhispania wa Utawala', 'tr': 'Öň bellenen Gaýd Edilmesi bilen Uzun Çikgi Mazmunlar', 'sq': 'Modelimi i Sekuencës së Lartë me vëmendje të paktë të parashikueshme', 'af': 'Long- range Sequence Modeling met voorskoubaar Sparse Aansig', 'hy': 'Երկար հեռավորության հաջորդականության մոդելավորումը կանխատեսելի փոքր ուշադրության հետ', 'az': 'Uzun səviyyə Sequence Modeling with Predictable Sparse Attention', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'দীর্ঘ সীমান্ত মোডেলিং স্পেরের সাথে মনোযোগ দিয়ে', 'bs': 'Modeliranje određene sekvence dugog dometa sa predvidljivom pažnjom prostora', 'cs': 'Modelování sekvencí s dlouhým dosahem s předvídatelnou řídkou pozorností', 'fi': 'Pitkän kantaman sekvenssimallinnus ennakoitavissa olevalla vähäisellä huomiolla', 'et': 'Kaugema järjestuse modelleerimine prognoositava vähese tähelepanuga', 'ca': 'Modell de seqüències a llarg distància amb una petita atenció previsible', 'sk': 'Modeliranje zaporedja dolgega dosega s predvidljivo redko pozornostjo', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Predictable Sparse Attention with Long-range Sequence Modeling', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'מודל רצף מרחק ארוך עם תשומת לב קטנה צפויה'}
{'en': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation QE aims to build predictive models to assess the quality of machine generated translations in the absence of reference translations While state of the art QE models have been shown to achieve good results they over rely on features that do not have a causal impact on the quality of a translation In particular there appears to be a partial input bias i.e. a tendency to assign high quality scores to translations that are fluent and grammatically correct even though they do not preserve the meaning of the source We analyse the partial input bias in further detail and evaluate four approaches to use auxiliary tasks for bias mitigation Two approaches use additional data to inform and support the main task while the other two are adversarial actively discouraging the model from learning the bias We compare the methods with respect to their ability to reduce the partial input bias while maintaining the overall performance We find that training a multitask architecture with an auxiliary binary classification task that utilises additional augmented data best achieves the desired effects and generalises well to different languages and quality metrics', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن آلية الانتباه الذاتي هي نهج فعال لالتقاط تبعيات السياق العالمي في نمذجة التسلسل ، ولكنها تعاني من التعقيد التربيعي في استخدام الوقت والذاكرة. نظرًا لتباين مصفوفة الانتباه ، فإن الكثير من الحسابات زائدة عن الحاجة. لذلك ، في هذا البحث ، قمنا بتصميم بنية محول فعالة ، تسمى Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT) ، لنمذجة تسلسل طويل المدى سريع. نحن نقدم منظورًا جديدًا تمامًا لإنشاء مصفوفة انتباه متفرقة ، أي جعل مصفوفة الانتباه المتفرقة قابلة للتنبؤ بها. وحدتان فرعيتان أساسيتان هما: (1) وحدة نمطية متقاطعة مخفية تعتمد على تحويل فورييه السريع ، والتي تلتقط وتجمع مجموعات دلالات $ L ^ 2 $ في $ \\ mathcal {O} (L \\ log L) $ تعقيد الوقت. (2) وحدة تقدير مصفوفة الانتباه المتفرقة ، والتي تتنبأ بالعناصر المهيمنة في مصفوفة الانتباه بناءً على ناتج الوحدة النمطية المتقاطعة السابقة المخفية. من خلال إعادة المعاملات والاقتطاع المتدرج ، نجحت FSAT في تعلم مؤشر العناصر السائدة. تم تقليل التعقيد الكلي حول طول التسلسل من $ \\ mathcal {O} (L ^ 2) $ إلى $ \\ mathcal {O} (L \\ log L) $. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة (اللغة الطبيعية ، والرؤية ، والرياضيات) أن FSAT تتفوق بشكل ملحوظ على الاهتمام القياسي متعدد الرؤوس ومتغيراته في مختلف المهام طويلة التسلسل بتكاليف حسابية منخفضة ، وتحقق نتائج جديدة على أحدث طراز على المدى الطويل معيار Range Arena.', 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que el mecanismo de autoatención es un enfoque eficaz para capturar las dependencias del contexto global en el modelado de secuencias, pero adolece de complejidad cuadrática en el uso de tiempo y memoria. Debido a la escasez de la matriz de atención, muchos cálculos son redundantes. Por lo tanto, en este artículo, diseñamos una arquitectura de transformador eficiente, llamada Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), para el modelado rápido de secuencias de largo alcance. Ofrecemos una perspectiva completamente nueva para construir una matriz de atención dispersa, es decir, hacer que la matriz de atención dispersa sea predecible. Dos submódulos principales son: (1) Un módulo cruzado de estado oculto basado en la transformada rápida de Fourier, que captura y agrupa combinaciones semánticas de $L^2$ en $\\ mathcal {O} (L\\ log L) $ complejidad temporal. (2) Un módulo de estimación de matriz de atención dispersa, que predice los elementos dominantes de una matriz de atención basada en la salida de el módulo cruzado de estado oculto anterior. Mediante la reparametrización y el truncamiento de gradientes, el FSAT aprendió con éxito el índice de los elementos dominantes. La complejidad general de la longitud de la secuencia se reduce de $\\ mathcal {O} (L^2) $ a $\\ mathcal {O} (L\\ log L) $. Experimentos extensos (lenguaje natural, visión y matemáticas) muestran que el FSAT supera notablemente la atención multicabezal estándar y sus variantes en varias tareas de secuencia larga con bajos costos computacionales, y logra nuevos resultados de vanguardia en el punto de referencia de Long Range Arena.', 'pt': 'O mecanismo de autoatenção demonstrou ser uma abordagem eficaz para capturar dependências de contexto global na modelagem de sequência, mas sofre de complexidade quadrática no uso de tempo e memória. Devido à escassez da matriz de atenção, muita computação é redundante. Portanto, neste artigo, projetamos uma arquitetura de transformador eficiente, denominada Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), para modelagem rápida de sequências de longo alcance. Fornecemos uma perspectiva totalmente nova para a construção da matriz de atenção esparsa, ou seja, tornando previsível a matriz de atenção esparsa. Dois submódulos principais são: (1) Um módulo cruzado de estado oculto baseado em transformada rápida de Fourier, que captura e agrupa $L^2$ combinações semânticas em $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ complexidade de tempo. (2) Um módulo de estimativa de matriz de atenção esparsa, que prevê elementos dominantes de uma matriz de atenção com base na saída do módulo cruzado de estado oculto anterior. Por reparametrização e truncamento de gradiente, o FSAT aprendeu com sucesso o índice de elementos dominantes. A complexidade geral sobre o comprimento da sequência é reduzida de $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ para $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Extensos experimentos (linguagem natural, visão e matemática) mostram que o FSAT supera notavelmente a atenção multi-cabeça padrão e suas variantes em várias tarefas de sequência longa com baixos custos computacionais e alcança novos resultados de última geração no Longo Referência Range Arena.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que le mécanisme d'auto-attention est une approche efficace pour saisir les dépendances du contexte global dans la modélisation séquentielle, mais il souffre d'une complexité quadratique en termes d'utilisation du temps et de la mémoire. En raison de la rareté de la matrice d'attention, de nombreux calculs sont redondants. Par conséquent, dans cet article, nous concevons une architecture de transformateur efficace, nommée Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), pour la modélisation rapide de séquences à longue portée. Nous proposons une toute nouvelle perspective pour construire une matrice d'attention clairsemée, c'est-à-dire rendre la matrice d'attention clairsemée prévisible. Deux sous-modules principaux sont\xa0: (1) Un module croisé d'état caché basé sur une transformée de Fourier rapide, qui capture et regroupe des combinaisons sémantiques $L^2$ dans une complexité temporelle $\xa0\\ mathcal {O} (L\xa0\\ log L) $. (2) Un module d'estimation de matrice d'attention clairsemée, qui prédit les éléments dominants d'une matrice d'attention sur la base de la sortie de le module croisé d'état caché précédent. Par reparamétrage et troncature de gradient, FSAT a appris avec succès l'indice des éléments dominants. La complexité globale de la longueur de séquence est réduite de $\xa0\\ mathcal {O} (L^2) $ à $\xa0\\ mathcal {O} (L\xa0\\ log L) $. Des expériences approfondies (langage naturel, vision et mathématiques) montrent que le FSAT surpasse remarquablement l'attention multi-têtes standard et ses variantes dans diverses tâches de longue séquence avec de faibles coûts de calcul, et obtient de nouveaux résultats de pointe sur le banc d'essai Long Range Arena.", 'ja': '自己注目メカニズムは、シーケンスモデリングにおけるグローバルコンテキスト依存性を捕捉するための効果的なアプローチであることが示されているが、時間とメモリ使用量の二次的な複雑さに苦しんでいる。 注意行列の希薄さのため、多くの計算は冗長である。 そこで、本稿では、高速長距離シーケンスモデリングのための効率的なトランスフォーマーアーキテクチャ、FSAT （ Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer ）を設計する。 私たちは、まばらな注意行列を構築するためのまったく新しい視点を提供します。すなわち、まばらな注意行列を予測可能にします。 2つのコアサブモジュールは、(1)高速フーリエ変換ベースの隠し状態クロスモジュールで、$\\ mathcal {O }( L\\ log L )$ time複雑性で$ L ^ 2 $の意味的な組み合わせをキャプチャしてプールします。(2)スパースアテンションマトリクス推定モジュールでは、以前の隠し状態クロスモジュールの出力に基づいて、アテンションマトリクスの支配的な要素を予測します。 再パラメータ化と勾配切り捨てにより、FSATは支配的な要素の指標をうまく学習した。 シーケンス長に関する全体的な複雑さは、$\\ mathcal {O }( L ^ 2 )$から$\\ mathcal {O }( L\\ log L )$に減少します。 広範な実験（自然言語、ビジョン、および数学）により、FSATは、低い計算コストでさまざまな長期タスクで標準的なマルチヘッド注意とそのバリアントを顕著に上回り、長距離アリーナベンチマークで新しい最先端の結果を達成することが示されています。', 'zh': '自注机制已证于序建模中获全局上下文赖有效,然其于时内存用者二复杂性。 注意矩阵疏,多算有余。 故设高效之变压器架构,谓之变压器傅里叶疏(FSAT),以速长距离序建模。 疏矩阵全新视角,疏意矩阵可知。 二心模块:(1)于傅里叶变之速藏模块,其获集$L^2$语义合,以$\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$时复杂度。 (2)疏矩阵度模块,盖先隐模块输以候矩阵元素也。 重参数化梯度断,FSAT成学元素。 夫序数之总复杂性自 $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ 降于 $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$。 博实验(自然语言视数学)明,FSAT以卑计算成本显优于准多头注意力变体,远程竞技场准试而取新最先进也。', 'hi': 'स्व-ध्यान तंत्र को अनुक्रम मॉडलिंग में वैश्विक संदर्भ निर्भरताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण दिखाया गया है, लेकिन यह समय और स्मृति उपयोग में द्विघात जटिलता से ग्रस्त है। ध्यान मैट्रिक्स की sparsity के कारण, बहुत गणना निरर्थक है। इसलिए, इस पेपर में, हम एक कुशल ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर डिजाइन करते हैं, जिसका नाम फूरियर विरल अटेंशन फॉर ट्रांसफॉर्मर (FSAT) है, तेजी से लंबी दूरी के अनुक्रम मॉडलिंग के लिए। हम विरल ध्यान मैट्रिक्स के निर्माण के लिए एक नया परिप्रेक्ष्य प्रदान करते हैं, यानी विरल ध्यान मैट्रिक्स को अनुमानित बनाना। दो कोर उप-मॉड्यूल हैं: (1) एक तेज़ फूरियर ट्रांसफ़ॉर्म आधारित छिपे हुए राज्य क्रॉस मॉड्यूल, जो $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ समय जटिलता में $L ^ 2 $ शब्दार्थ संयोजनों को कैप्चर और पूल करता है। (2) एक विरल ध्यान मैट्रिक्स अनुमान मॉड्यूल, जो पिछले छिपे हुए राज्य क्रॉस मॉड्यूल के आउटपुट के आधार पर एक ध्यान मैट्रिक्स के प्रमुख तत्वों की भविष्यवाणी करता है। reparameterization और ग्रेडिएंट ट्रंकेशन द्वारा, FSAT सफलतापूर्वक प्रमुख तत्वों के सूचकांक सीखा। अनुक्रम लंबाई के बारे में समग्र जटिलता $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ से $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$तक कम हो जाती है. व्यापक प्रयोगों (प्राकृतिक भाषा, दृष्टि, और गणित) से पता चलता है कि FSAT उल्लेखनीय रूप से कम कम्प्यूटेशनल लागत के साथ विभिन्न लंबे अनुक्रम कार्यों में मानक बहु-सिर ध्यान और इसके संस्करणों को बेहतर बनाता है, और लंबी दूरी के एरिना बेंचमार्क पर नए अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Показано, что механизм самовнимания является эффективным подходом для захвата глобальных зависимостей контекста в моделировании последовательностей, но он страдает квадратичной сложностью во времени и использовании памяти. Из-за редкости матрицы внимания, много вычислений является избыточным. Поэтому в этой статье мы проектируем эффективную архитектуру трансформатора, названную Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), для быстрого моделирования последовательности на большие расстояния. Мы предоставляем совершенно новую перспективу для построения матрицы редкого внимания, т.е. делая матрицу редкого внимания предсказуемой. Два основных подмодуля представляют собой: (1) модуль скрытого перекрестного состояния на основе быстрого преобразования Фурье, который захватывает и объединяет $ L^2 $ семантических комбинаций в $\\ mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$ временной сложности. (2) Модуль оценки матрицы редкого внимания, который предсказывает доминирующие элементы матрицы внимания на основе вывода предыдущего модуля скрытого перекрестного состояния. Путем репараметризации и усечения градиента FSAT успешно изучила индекс доминирующих элементов. Общая сложность длины последовательности уменьшается с $\\ mathcal {O}(L^2)$ до $\\ mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Обширные эксперименты (естественный язык, зрение и математика) показывают, что FSAT значительно превосходит стандартное многоголовое внимание и его варианты в различных задачах длинной последовательности с низкими вычислительными затратами и достигает новых современных результатов по эталону Long Range Arena.', 'ga': "Tá sé léirithe gur cur chuige éifeachtach é meicníocht féin-aire chun spleáchas comhthéacs domhanda i samhaltú seichimh a ghabháil, ach tá sé thíos le castacht chearnach in úsáid ama agus cuimhne. Mar gheall ar theine na maitrís aird, tá go leor ríomh iomarcach. Dá bhrí sin, sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid dearadh ar ailtireacht Trasfhoirmeoir éifeachtach, darb ainm Fourier Sprse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), le haghaidh samhaltú seicheamh fadraoin tapa. Cuirimid peirspictíocht úrnua ar fáil maidir le tógáil maitrís tearc-aird, i.e. an maitrís aird gann a dhéanamh intuartha. Is iad dhá fho-mhodúl lárnacha: (1) Trasmhodúl stáit fholaigh bunaithe ar fho-mhodúl a chlaochlú go tapa Fourier, a ghlacann agus a chomhthiomsaíonn teaglaim shéimeantacha $L^2$ i gcastacht ama $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Modúl meastacháin maitrís aird gann, a thuar gnéithe ceannasacha maitrís aird bunaithe ar aschur an tras-mhodúil stáit i bhfolach roimhe seo. Trí athparaiméadarú agus teascadh grádán, d'éirigh le FSAT innéacs na n-eilimintí ceannasacha a fhoghlaim. Laghdaítear an chastacht iomlán maidir le fad an tseichimh ó $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ go $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing (teanga nádúrtha, fís, agus matamaitic) go n-éiríonn thar barr le FSAT an aird chaighdeánach ilcheann agus a leagan amach i dtascanna éagsúla seicheamh fada le costais ríomha ísle, agus go mbaineann sé amach torthaí nua den scoth ar an Long. Tagarmharc raon Arena.", 'el': 'Ο μηχανισμός αυτοπροσοχής έχει αποδειχθεί ότι είναι μια αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για την καταγραφή των παγκόσμιων εξαρτήσεων περιβάλλοντος στη μοντελοποίηση ακολουθίας, αλλά πάσχει από τετραγωνική πολυπλοκότητα στη χρήση χρόνου και μνήμης. Λόγω της λεπτότητας της μήτρας προσοχής, πολύς υπολογισμός είναι περιττός. Ως εκ τούτου, σε αυτή την εργασία, σχεδιάζουμε μια αποδοτική αρχιτεκτονική μετασχηματιστή, ονόματι Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), για γρήγορη μοντελοποίηση ακολουθίας μεγάλης εμβέλειας. Παρέχουμε μια ολοκαίνουργια προοπτική για την κατασκευή του πίνακα αραιής προσοχής, δηλαδή κάνοντας τον πίνακα αραιής προσοχής προβλέψιμο. Δύο βασικές υπο-ενότητες είναι: (1) Μια γρήγορη βασισμένη σε μετασχηματισμό Κρυμμένης κατάστασης ενότητα, η οποία συλλαμβάνει και συγκεντρώνει σημασιολογικούς συνδυασμούς $σε χρονική πολυπλοκότητα $\\μαθηματικών{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Ενότητα εκτίμησης αραιής μήτρας προσοχής, η οποία προβλέπει κυρίαρχα στοιχεία ενός πίνακα προσοχής με βάση την έξοδο της προηγούμενης ενότητας σταυρού κρυφής κατάστασης. Με τον επαναπροσδιορισμό και την περικοπή κλίσης, η FSAT έμαθε επιτυχώς τον δείκτη των κυρίαρχων στοιχείων. Η συνολική πολυπλοκότητα σχετικά με το μήκος ακολουθίας μειώνεται από $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ σε $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα (φυσική γλώσσα, όραση και μαθηματικά) δείχνουν ότι η FSAT ξεπερνά σημαντικά την τυπική προσοχή πολλαπλών κεφαλών και τις παραλλαγές της σε διάφορες εργασίες μακράς ακολουθίας με χαμηλό υπολογιστικό κόστος και επιτυγχάνει νέα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο σημείο αναφοράς μεγάλης εμβέλειας.', 'hu': 'Az önfigyelemmel kísérő mechanizmus hatékony megközelítésnek bizonyult a globális kontextusfüggőségek rögzítésére a szekvencia modellezésben, de az idő- és memóriahasználat négyszöges komplexitásától szenved. A figyelemmátrix ritkasága miatt sok számítás redundáns. Ezért ebben a tanulmányban egy hatékony transzformátor architektúrát tervezünk, a Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT) elnevezésű, gyors, hosszú távolságú szekvencia modellezéséhez. Teljesen új perspektívát nyújtunk a ritka figyelemmátrix kialakításához, azaz kiszámíthatóvá téve a ritka figyelemmátrixot. Két alapvető alpodul: (1) Egy gyors Fourier transzformációs alapú rejtett állapotkeresztmodul, amely rögzíti és összegyűjti a $L^2$ szemantikai kombinációkat $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ időbonyolultságban. (2) Egy ritka figyelemmátrix becslési modul, amely előrejelzi a figyelemmátrix domináns elemeit az előző rejtett állapotkeresztmodul kimenete alapján. Az FSAT átalakítással és gradiens csonkítással sikeresen megtanulta a domináns elemek indexét. A sorozathossz összetettsége $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$-ról $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$-ra csökken. A kiterjedt kísérletek (természetes nyelv, látás és matematika) azt mutatják, hogy az FSAT jelentősen felülmúlja a szabványos többfejű figyelmet és annak változatait különböző hosszú sorozatú feladatokban alacsony számítási költségekkel, és új, korszerű eredményeket ér el a Long Range Arena referenciaértékén.', 'ka': 'მოჩვენებულია თავისუფალური მექანსი, რომელიც გლობალური კონტექსტური დასახლოებისთვის მოდელეციის შესახებ ეფექტიური პროგრამია, მაგრამ ის კვადრატიური კომპლექსიტეტიდა მარტიკის შესაძლებლობით, ძალიან კომპუტექტურაცია უფრო უფრო უფრო გარჩენა. ამიტომ, ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ეფექტიური ტრანფორმეტრის აქტიქტიქტურაცია, სახელი Fourier Sparse ატრანფორმეტრის (FSAT) მოდულებაში, ძალიან ძალიან სიგრძე სიგრძე მოდელები ჩვენ ახალი პერსპექტიკის კონტრუქტურაციას გავაკეთებთ, მაგალითად გავაკეთებთ წარმოიდგინელი დაახლოების მარტიკი. ორი სამყარო მოდულები არის: (1) ბრძელი ფორიერის ტრანფიგურაცია დაფარდებული სამყარო მოდულია, რომელიც დააკვირდება და დააკვირდება $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ დროის კომპლექცია. (2) მხოლოდ დაახლოების მარტიკის მოდულია, რომელიც დაახლოების დომინტური ელემენტები მარტიკის მონაცემებით, რომელიც მხოლოდ დაახლოებით წინა დაახლოების კრისი რეპაპამეტრიზაცია და გრადიენტის რუნქციაზე FSAT წარმატებით დავისწავლა დომინენტის ელემენტების ინდექსი. სერვენტის სიგრძე შესახებ საერთო კომპლექცია $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ დან $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები (ბუნებრივი ენერგია, ხედი და მათემატიკა) აჩვენებენ, რომ FSAT უფრო გასაზღვრებელია სტანდარტული მრავალთან დაახლოებით და მისი განსაზღვრები განსხვავებულ განსხვავებულ დავალებში, რომლებიც ცოტა კომპ', 'it': "Il meccanismo di auto-attenzione è stato dimostrato di essere un approccio efficace per catturare le dipendenze del contesto globale nella modellazione sequenziale, ma soffre di complessità quadratica nell'uso del tempo e della memoria. A causa della scarsità della matrice di attenzione, molti calcoli sono ridondanti. Pertanto, in questo articolo, progettiamo un'efficiente architettura Transformer, denominata Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), per la modellazione rapida delle sequenze a lungo raggio. Forniamo una prospettiva completamente nuova per costruire una matrice di attenzione sparsa, cioè rendendo prevedibile la matrice di attenzione sparsa. Due sottomoduli principali sono: (1) Un veloce modulo incrociato di stato nascosto basato sulla trasformazione Fourier, che cattura e raggruppa combinazioni semantiche $L^2$ in $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ complessità temporale. (2) Un modulo di stima della matrice di attenzione sparsa, che prevede elementi dominanti di una matrice di attenzione basata sull'output del precedente modulo incrociato di stato nascosto. Attraverso la reparameterizzazione e il tronco gradiente, FSAT ha imparato con successo l'indice degli elementi dominanti. La complessità complessiva della lunghezza della sequenza è ridotta da $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ a $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Esperimenti approfonditi (linguaggio naturale, visione e matematica) mostrano che FSAT supera notevolmente l'attenzione multi-testa standard e le sue varianti in varie attività a lunga sequenza con bassi costi di calcolo, e raggiunge nuovi risultati all'avanguardia sul benchmark Long Range Arena.", 'lt': 'Nustatyta, kad savarankiško dėmesio mechanizmas yra veiksmingas požiūris į pasaulinio konteksto priklausomybę nuo sekos modeliavimo, tačiau jis kenčia nuo kvadratinio laiko ir atminties naudojimo sudėtingumo. Atsižvelgiant į dėmesio matricos nedažnumą, daug skaičiavimų nereikalinga. Todėl šiame dokumente sukuriame veiksmingą Transformer architektūrą, vadinamą Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), skirtą greitai ilgalaikiam sekos modeliavimui. Mes suteikiame visiškai naują perspektyvą, kad būtų sukurta nedidelio dėmesio matrica, t. y. kad nedidelio dėmesio matrica būtų nuspėjama. Dvi pagrindiniai posmoduliai yra: (1) greitas slapta būsenos kryžminis modulis, pagrįstas Fourier transformatoriumi, kuris gauna ir sujungia $L^2$ semantinius derinius $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ laiko sudėtingumu. (2) Mažo dėmesio matricos vertinimo modulis, kuriame numatomi dominuojantys dėmesio matricos elementai, pagrįsti ankstesnio paslėptos būsenos kryžminio modulio išėjimu. Remiantis parametrizacija ir gradient ų sutraukimu FSAT sėkmingai išmoko dominuojančių elementų indeksą. Bendras sekos ilgio sudėtingumas sumažėja nuo $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ iki $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Išsamūs eksperimentai (natūrali kalba, regėjimas ir matematika) rodo, kad FSAT gerokai viršija standartinį daugiakalbį dėmesį ir jo variantus įvairiose ilgalaikėse užduotyse su mažomis skaičiavimo sąnaudomis ir pasiekia naujų pažangiausių rezultatų pagal Long Range Arena standartą.', 'kk': 'Өзіңіздің тәртіпсіздік механизмі жүйелік контексті тәуелдіктерді реттеу үшін әсер ететін тәртіпсіздік болып көрсетілді, бірақ ол уақыт мен жады пайдалануында квадратикалық тәуелдікт Бақылау матрициясының көп есептеулері қайта жоқ. Сондықтан, бұл қағазда, жылдам ауқым аралығының үшін Fourier Sparse аталған түрлендіруші архитектурасын құрамыз. Біз жаңа тәртіпке қарау матрицасын құру үшін жаңа тәртіпке келтіреміз, яғни бөлек тәртіпке қарау матрицасын таңдау үшін. Екі негізгі ішкі модульдер: 1) Fourier негізінде жасырын күй- жайын күй- жайын түрлендіру модульі. Бұл $L^2$ семантикалық комбинацияларын $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ уақыттың комплексілігін түсіндіреді. (2) Алдыңғы жасырын күй- жай модулінің шығысына негізделген үлкен матрицаның доминистік элементтерін көрсетеді. Репараметризация және градиенттің түсіруі арқылы, FSAT доминистік элементтердің индексін сәтті үйренді. Реттеу ұзындығының жалпы комплексілігі $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ дегеннен $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ дегенге азайтылады. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер (тәуелсіз тіл, көрініс және математика) FSAT стандартты көп басып қарау және оның әртүрлі уақыттарды басқа ұзындық тапсырмалардың бірнеше есептеу бағаттары арқылы өзгертеді, және ұзындық аумағындағы жаң', 'mk': 'Механизмот за самовнимание се покажа дека е ефикасен пристап за заземање на глобалните зависности од контекст во моделирањето на секвенци, но страда од квадратна комплексност во користењето на времето и меморијата. Поради реткоста на матрицата на вниманието, многу пресметки се претерани. Затоа, во овој весник, дизајнираме ефикасна трансформна архитектура, наречена Фуриер Спарс внимание за трансформирање (ФСАТ), за брзо моделирање на долг домет. We provide a brand-new perspective for constructing sparse attention matrix, i.e. making the sparse attention matrix predictable.  Двајца субмодули се: (1) Брз крив модул базиран на трансформирање на Фуриер, кој фаќа и спојува семантични комбинации $L^2$ во $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ временска комплексност. (2) Модул за проценка на матрица на мало внимание, кој предвидува доминантни елементи на матрица на внимание базиран на излезот на претходниот скриен крстомодул на состојбата. Со репараметеризација и брзина на градиентите, FSAT успешно го научи индексот на доминантните елементи. Вкупната комплексност во врска со должината на секвенцијата е намалена од $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ на $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Extensive experiments (natural language, vision, and math) show that FSAT remarkably outperforms the standard multi-head attention and its variants in various long-sequence tasks with low computational costs, and achieves new state-of-the-art results on the Long Range Arena benchmark.', 'ms': 'Mekanisme perhatian-diri telah dipaparkan sebagai pendekatan yang efektif untuk menangkap dependensi konteks global dalam pemodelan urutan, tetapi ia menderita dari kompleksiti kuadratik dalam masa dan penggunaan ingatan. Kerana kecepatan matriks perhatian, banyak pengiraan terlalu berlebihan. Oleh itu, dalam kertas ini, kami merancang arkitektur Transformer yang efisien, bernama Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), untuk model urutan jarak panjang pantas. Kami menyediakan perspektif baru untuk membina matriks perhatian yang sedikit, iaitu menjadikan matriks perhatian yang sedikit terduga. Dua sub-modul utama ialah: (1) Modul salib keadaan tersembunyi berdasarkan transformasi Fourier yang pantas, yang menangkap dan mengumpulkan kombinasi semantik $L^2$ dalam kompleksiti masa $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Modul penilaian matriks perhatian ringan, yang meramalkan unsur dominan matriks perhatian berdasarkan output modul salib keadaan tersembunyi terdahulu. Dengan pemarahan semula dan pemotongan gradien, FSAT berjaya mempelajari indeks unsur dominan. Kekompleksian umum tentang panjang urutan dikurangkan dari $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ ke $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Eksperimen luas (bahasa semulajadi, penglihatan dan matematika) menunjukkan bahawa FSAT sangat melebihi perhatian standar multi-kepala dan variasinya dalam pelbagai tugas urutan panjang dengan biaya pengiraan rendah, dan mencapai keputusan state-of-the-art baru pada tanda referensi Arena Jarak Panjang.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യത്തിന്റെ മെക്സെക്സ്റ്റ് മോഡലിങില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തമായ പ്രായ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മാറ്റിക്സിന്റെ പ്രത്യേകം കാരണം, വളരെ കണക്ക് കുറവാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വേഗത്തില്\u200d നീണ്ട നീണ്ട ട ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d സ്പേഴ്സ് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഫ്രാന്\u200dസ് സ്പേഴ്സ് ശ്രദ് സ്പേസ് ശ്രദ്ധ മാറ്റ്രിക്സ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ബ്രാന്റ് പുതിയ കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതായത്  രണ്ടു മൂലകങ്ങള്\u200d: (1) മറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ ക്രിസ്സ് ഘടകം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ നാല് മാറ്റം നാല് മാറ്റുന്നു. അത് പിടിക്കുന്നു $L^2$ സെമാന്റിക് കൂട് (2) മുമ്പ് ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന രാജ്യത്തെ ക്രിസ്സിന്റെ ഫലം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കി അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധയുടെ മേട്രിക്സ് ഗണന ഘടകം പ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതും ഗ്രേഡിയന്റ് ട്രാങ്കിങ്കേഷനുമായി FSAT വിജയകരമായ മൂലകങ്ങളുടെ സൂചിപ്പ് പഠിച്ചു. The overall complexity about the sequence length is reduced from $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ to $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$.  അധിക പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d (സ്വാഭാഷ, ദര്\u200dശനം, ഗണിതം) കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു FSAT സാധാരണ തലയുടെ ശ്രദ്ധയും അതിന്\u200dറെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളും കുറച്ച് നീണ്ട കണക്കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് ചെലവഴിക്കുന്', 'mt': "Il-mekkaniżmu ta’ awtonomija wera li huwa approċċ effettiv biex jinqabdu d-dipendenzi tal-kuntest globali fl-immudellar tas-sekwenzi, iżda jbati minn kumplessità kwadratika fl-użu tal-ħin u l-memorja. Minħabba l-iskarsezza tal-matriċi tal-attenzjoni, ħafna komputazzjoni hija żejda. Għalhekk, f’dan id-dokument, aħna niddisinjaw arkitettura Transformer effiċjenti, imsejħa Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), għal mudellar rapidu ta’ sekwenza fuq medda twila. Aħna nipprovdu perspettiva ġdida b’mod ċar għall-bini ta’ matriċi ta’ attenzjoni baxxa, jiġifieri li l-matriċi ta’ attenzjoni baxxa ssir prevedibbli. Żewġ sottomoduli ewlenin huma: (1) Modulu ta' trasformazzjoni mgħaġġla bbażat fuq it-trasformazzjoni ta' Fourier moħbi ta' kundizzjoni moħbija, li jaqbad u jiġbor flimkien kombinazzjonijiet semantiċi ta' $L^2$ f'kumplessità ta' ħin ta' $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Modulu ta’ stima tal-matriċi ta’ attenzjoni baxxa, li jipprevedi elementi dominanti ta’ matriċi ta’ attenzjoni bbażata fuq il-ħruġ tal-modulu trasversali ta’ stat moħbi preċedenti. Permezz tar-ripameterizzazzjoni u t-trunċjar gradjenti, FSAT għallem b’suċċess l-indiċi ta’ elementi dominanti. Il-kumplessità globali dwar it-tul tas-sekwenza titnaqqas minn $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ għal $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Extensive experiments (natural language, vision, and math) show that FSAT remarkably outperforms the standard multi-head attention and its variants in various long-sequence tasks with low computational costs, and achieves new state-of-the-art results on the Long Range Arena benchmark.", 'no': 'Mekanismenyen for selvmerksomhet er vist som ein effektiv tilnærming for å henta globale kontekstavhengighet i sekvensmodellering, men det går frå kvadratisk kompleksitet i tid og minnebruk. På grunn av sparsiteten av oppmerksmatrisen er mykje rekninga redundant. I denne papiret designerer vi eit effektivt transformeringsarkitektur, kalla Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), for rask lang område- modellering. Vi tilbyr eit nytt perspektiv for å konstruere sparse oppmerksmatrise, t.d. for å gjera den sparse oppmerksmatrisen forhåndsvisbar. To kjernemodular er: (1) Eit rask Fourier-transformering basert på skjulte tilstandsmodul, som tar opp og koplar $L^2$ semantiske kombinasjonar i $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ tidkompleksitet. (2) Eit sparse oppmerksmatriseestimamodul, som forventar dominerande elementar av eit oppmerksmatrise basert på utdata av den førre skjulte tilstandsmodulen. På reparametrisering og trumpering av fargeovergangar lærte FSAT indeksen til dominerande elementer. Den generelle kompleksiteten om sekvenslengden er redusert frå $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ til $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Utvida eksperimenter (naturspråk, vising og matematikk) viser at FSAT utfører vanskeleg forståelse av standardverdien og variasjonane i ulike langsekvens oppgåver med låge computational kostnader, og oppnår nye tilstand av kunsten på Long Range Arena-benchmarket.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że mechanizm własnej uwagi jest skutecznym podejściem do przechwytywania globalnych zależności kontekstu w modelowaniu sekwencji, ale cierpi on na kwadratową złożoność w czasie i pamięci. Ze względu na słabość macierzy uwagi, wiele obliczeń jest zbędnych. Dlatego w niniejszym artykule projektujemy efektywną architekturę transformatora o nazwie Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), umożliwiającą szybkie modelowanie sekwencji dalekiego zasięgu. Zapewniamy zupełnie nową perspektywę konstruowania macierzy rzadkiej uwagi, czyli czyniąc macierzę rzadkiej uwagi przewidywalną. Dwa podmoduły podstawowe to: (1) Szybki moduł krzyżowy ukryty stan oparty na transformacji Fouriera, który przechwytuje i łączy kombinacje semantyczne $L^2$ w złożoności czasu $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ . (2) Moduł oszacowania macierzy uwagi rzadkiej, który przewiduje dominujące elementy macierzy uwagi na podstawie wyjścia poprzedniego modułu krzyżowego ukrytego stanu. Poprzez reprameteryzację i cięcie gradientów, FSAT z powodzeniem poznał indeks pierwiastków dominujących. Ogólna złożoność długości sekwencji jest zmniejszona z $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ do $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Obszerne eksperymenty (język naturalny, wizja i matematyka) pokazują, że FSAT znacznie przewyższa standardową uwagę wielogłowicową i jego warianty w różnych zadaniach długich sekwencji przy niskich kosztach obliczeniowych i osiąga nowe najnowocześniejsze wyniki w odniesieniu do benchmarku Long Range Arena.', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизм нь дэлхийн контекстийн загварын хамааралтай байдлыг дарааллаар загварын загварын тулд эффективны арга болгон харагдаж байна. Гэхдээ энэ нь цаг хугацаа, санамж хэрэглэгдэх Анхаарлын матрицаас бага зэрэг маш олон тооцоололтой байдаг. Тиймээс энэ цаасан дээр бид хурдан хурдан дарааллын загварын загварын тулд үр дүнтэй Трансфер архитектурыг зохион бүтээж байна. Бид бага анхаарлын матрицыг бүтээхэд бренд шинэ харагдаж байна. Хоёр төвөгтэй суб-модуль нь: (1) Хурдан Fourier-ын төвөгтэй нуугдаж буй тогтмодуль нь $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ хугацааны цогцолтоос $L^2$ хэмжээний семантик комбинацийг оруулдаг. (2) Өмнөх нууцлаг орнуудын давхар модуль дээр үндсэн анхаарлын матриксын давхар элементүүдийг тодорхойлж буй анхаарлын матриксын тооцооллын модуль. ФСАТ давхарамеризацийн болон градиентын багасгалтаар давхар элементүүдийн индексийг амжилттай сурсан. Дараагийн уртын нийтлэг цогцолтыг $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ ээс $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ руу багасгаж байна. Өнгөрсөн туршилтууд (байгалийн хэл, үзэл, математик) FSAT нь стандарт олон толгой анхаарал болон түүний өөрчлөлтийг бага тооны зардалтай олон удаан дараах үйлдлийн даалгавар дээр гайхалтай үр дүнг гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Mecanismul de auto-atenție a fost demonstrat a fi o abordare eficientă pentru captarea dependențelor contextului global în modelarea secvențelor, dar suferă de complexitatea pătratică în utilizarea timpului și a memoriei. Datorită lipsității matricei de atenție, multe calcule sunt redundante. Prin urmare, în această lucrare, proiectăm o arhitectură eficientă a transformatorului, numită Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), pentru modelarea rapidă a secvențelor pe raze lungi. Oferim o perspectivă nouă pentru construirea matricii de atenție slabă, adică pentru a face matricea atenției slabe previzibilă. Două submodule de bază sunt: (1) Un modul rapid bazat pe transformare Fourier, care capturează și combină combinații semantice $L^2$ în complexitatea timpului $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Un modul de estimare a matricei de atenție rară, care prezice elemente dominante ale unei matrice de atenție pe baza rezultatului anterior modul transversal al stării ascunse. Prin reparameterizare și trunchiere gradientă, FSAT a învățat cu succes indicele elementelor dominante. Complexitatea generală a lungimii secvenței este redusă de la $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ la $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Experimente extinse (limbaj natural, viziune și matematică) arată că FSAT depășește remarcabil atenția standard multi-head și variantele sale în diferite sarcini de secvență lungă, cu costuri de calcul scăzute, și obține noi rezultate de ultimă oră pe benchmark Long Range Arena.', 'so': 'Isboortiisa waxaa looga muujiyey qaab faa’iido ah oo ku qabsashada hoosta caalamiga ku xiran sameynta qaabilsan, laakiin waxay ka dhibaataysaa dhaqanka xilliga iyo isticmaalka xusuusta. Xaaladda dareemada dareemada darteed, xisaab badan ayaa yaraaday. Sidaa darteed, waxan warqaddan ku qornaa, waxaan qoraynaa dhismaha aad u shaqeeya ee turjumista, magaceeda la yidhaahdo Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), si loo sameynayo sameynta dhaadheer oo dheer. Waxaynu siinaynaa aragti cusub oo aan dhisno matrix xannaano yar, taas oo laga yaabaa in la sii sheego kaleemeysiga jimicsiga. Laba qalabka hoose waa:(1) Isbedelka qoraalka dowladda ee qarsoon oo qarsoon, kaas oo qabsada iyo dhaqaalaha $L^2$ qayb ah oo ku qoran $\\Mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$ waqti adag. (2) Midabka qiimeynta jimicsiga ee qiimeynta jimicsiga, kaas oo ka hor dooranaya qalabka kordhinta ee qarsoon By reparameterization and gradient truncation, FSAT successfully learned the index of dominant elements.  Dhibaatada la xiriira dhererka dhamaantooda waxaa laga soo yareeyaa $\\xisaabta {O}(L^2)$ ilaa $\\Mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$. Imtixaano dheeraad ah (luuqada dabiiciga, muuqashada iyo xisaabta) waxay muujiyaan in FSAT si dhab ah ugu muujiyaa daryeelka caadiga ah oo madaxa badan iyo kala bedelayaashiisa oo ku jira shaqooyinka badan oo aad u dhaadheer kharashka xisaabta hoos u ah, wuxuuna helaa xaalad cusub oo farshaxan ku saabsan heerka dheerka.', 'sr': 'Pokazano je da je mehanizam samoupažnje efikasan pristup za uhvativanje globalnih kontekstskih zavisnosti u modelima sekvence, ali pati od kvadratske kompleksnosti u vremenu i upotrebi pamćenja. Zbog svjetlosti pažnje matrice, mnogo raèunanja je prepuna. Stoga, u ovom papiru, dizajniramo efikasnu arhitekturu transformera po imenu Fourier Sparse pažnju za transformer (FSAT), za modeliranje brzog rasporeda. Mi obezbeđujemo novu perspektivu za konstrukciju rezervne pažnje matrice, tj. da predvidimo rezervnu pažnju matricu. Dva jezgra podmodula su: (1) Brza transformacija Fouriera bazirana na skrivenom stanju prekršenom modulu, koji uhvata i bazena semantične kombinacije $ L^2$ u $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ vremenske kompleksnosti. (2) Pošteni modul procjene matrice pažnje, koji predviđa dominantne elemente pažnje matrice na osnovu izlaza prethodnog skrivenog stanja prekršnog modula. Prema reparameterizaciji i truncaciji gradienta, FSAT je uspešno naučio indeks dominantnih elementa. Ukupna kompleksnost o dužini sekvence smanjuje se od $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ na $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Eksperimenti (prirodni jezik, vizija i matematika) pokazuju da FSAT izuzetno nadmašuje standardnu multiglavnu pažnju i varijante u različitim dugoročnim zadatkima sa niskim računalnim troškovima, i postiže nove rezultate umjetnosti na kritičnoj liniji Long Range Arena.', 'sv': 'Sjﾃ､lvuppmﾃ､rksamhetsmekanism har visat sig vara ett effektivt tillvﾃ､gagﾃ･ngssﾃ､tt fﾃｶr att fﾃ･nga globala kontextberoenden i sekvensmodellering, men den lider av kvadratisk komplexitet i tid och minne anvﾃ､ndning. Pﾃ･ grund av uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmatsens sparsamhet ﾃ､r mycket berﾃ､kning ﾃｶverflﾃｶdig. Dﾃ､rfﾃｶr designar vi i denna uppsats en effektiv transformatorarkitektur, kallad Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), fﾃｶr snabb sekvensmodellering med lﾃ･ng rﾃ､ckvidd. Vi ger ett helt nytt perspektiv fﾃｶr att bygga sparsam uppmﾃ､rksamhet matris, dvs gﾃｶra den sparsam uppmﾃ､rksamhet matris fﾃｶrutsﾃ､gbar. Tvﾃ･ centrala undermoduler ﾃ､r: (1) En snabb Fourier transform baserad dold tillstﾃ･ndsﾃｶversmodul, som fﾃ･ngar och samlar ihop $L^2$ semantiska kombinationer i $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ tidskomplexitet. (2) En skattningsmodul fﾃｶr gles uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmatris, som fﾃｶrutspﾃ･r dominerande element i en uppmﾃ､rksamhetsmatris baserat pﾃ･ resultatet frﾃ･n den tidigare dolda tillstﾃ･ndsﾃｶversmodulen. Genom omprameterisering och gradient trunkering lﾃ､rde FSAT sig framgﾃ･ngsrikt indexet fﾃｶr dominerande element. Den totala komplexiteten kring sekvenslﾃ､ngden minskas frﾃ･n $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ till $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Omfattande experiment (naturligt sprﾃ･k, vision och matematik) visar att FSAT avsevﾃ､rt ﾃｶvertrﾃ､ffar standard multi-head uppmﾃ､rksamhet och dess varianter i olika lﾃ･nga sekvensuppgifter med lﾃ･ga berﾃ､kningskostnader, och uppnﾃ･r nya state-of-the-art resultat pﾃ･ Long Range Arena benchmark.', 'si': 'ස්වයංග්\u200dරහය අවධානයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ලෝක සංවේදනය අවධානයක් අල්ලගන්න, ඒත් ඒක වෙලාව සහ මතකය භාවිතාවය අවධානයක් මැට්\u200dරික්ස් ගැන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිසා, ගොඩක් ගණනාකරණය වැඩියි. ඉතින්, මේ පත්තරේ අපි හැකියාවක් වෙනුවෙන් හැකියාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්ථාපනය කරන්න, ෆෝරියර් ස්පාර්ස් අවධානය (FSAT) කිරීම අපි බ්\u200dරෑන්ඩ් අලුත් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් දෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවධානය මොඩියුල් දෙකක් තමයි: (1) වේගයෙන් ෆෝරියර් ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් ආධාරිත ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා, ඒක $\\matical{O}(L\\log L)$ වෙලාව සංකල්පයක් වල $L^2$ (2) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවධානය මත්\u200dරික්ස් අනුමාණය මොඩියුල්, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා අවධානය ම ආපහු ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ග්\u200dරේඩියෙන්ට් ට්\u200dරැන්කේෂන් වලින්, FSAT සමහර විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන අයිතිකාරයේ ස ක්\u200dරමාණය ගැන සම්පූර්ණ සංකෘතිය $\\matical{O}(L^2)$ වල $\\matical{O}(L\\log L)$ වලින් අඩු වෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණය (ස්වභාවික භාෂාව, දර්ශනය, හා ගණිත) පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට FSAT ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂ විශේෂ අවධානය සහ ඒක විදිහට පරීක්ෂ', 'ta': 'தொடர்ந்து மாதிரியில் சார்ந்த சார்புகளை பெறுவதற்கான தானே கவனம் முறைமையாக காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஆனால் நேரத்தில் மற்றும் நினைவு பயன்படுத் Due to the sparsity of the attention matrix, much computation is redundant.  எனவே, இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு வேகமான மாற்று மாற்றும் உருவாக்கத்தை வடிவமைக்கிறோம், பெயர் நான்கு சென்ஸ் கவனத்தை மாற்றுவதற்கு (FSAT) என்று, வே நாம் ஒரு கிளை புதிய பார்வையை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அதாவது, ஸ்பெஸ் கவனத்தின் மாட்ரிக்ஸை முன்வெளிப்படுத்துகிறது. இரண்டு மூல துணை கூறுகள்: (1) ஒரு வேகமான நான்கு மாற்றம் மறைந்த நிலை குறிக்கும் பகுதியில் உள்ளது, அது $L^2 டாலர் பிடித்துக் கொண்டுள்ளது மற்றும் பூச்சிடுகிறது $mathcal { (2) முந்தைய மறைந்த நிலை குறிப்பிட்ட கூற்றின் வெளியீட்டை அடிப்படையிலான மேலாண்மையான உறுப்பு மீட்டமைப்பு மற்றும் சுழற்சி சுழற்சி மூலம் FSAT வெற்றிகரமாக முக்கிய உறுப்புகளின் சுட்டுவரிசையை கற்று தொடர்ந்து நீளத்தைப் பற்றிய மொத்த சிக்கல் $\\mathcal {O}(L^2)$க்கு $mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$ குறைக்கப்படுகிறது. விரிவான சோதனைகள் (இயல்பான மொழி, பார்வை மற்றும் கணிதம்) FSAT காண்பிக்கிறது என்றால் FSAT மிகவும் குறைந்த நீண்ட கணக்கிட விலைகளில் நிலையான பல தலைப்பு கவனத்தை மற்றும் அதன் மாறிகளை வெளியேற', 'ur': 'اپنی توجه کی مکانیسی دکھائی گئی ہے کہ گلوبی کنٹنس کی اپنا انتظام دکھانے کے لئے ایک اثرات طریقہ ہے، لیکن یہ ساعت اور یاد استعمال میں چوڑھائی پیچیدگی سے ہے. توجه ماٹریکس کی سستی کے باعث بہت سی کمپیوٹریسی دور ہے۔ لہٰذا، ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک عمدہ تغییر پھیلانے والے معماری طراحی کر رہے ہیں، جس کا نام Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer ہم نے ایک برندن نئی نظر بنایا ہے کہ اسپرس توجه ماٹریکس بنانے کے لئے، یعنی اسپرس توجه ماٹریکس کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے۔ دو کور زیر موڈیلوں یہ ہیں: (1) ایک تیز فوریئر نے بنیاد رکھا ہے چھپا ہوا موڈیلوں، جو $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ وقت پیچیدگی میں $ L^2$ سیمنٹی کمونٹیوں کو پکڑتا ہے۔ (2) ایک اچھی توجه ماٹریکس اچھی مطابق مطابق مطابق موڈیل، جو ایک اظہار ماٹریکس کے ماٹریکس کے ماٹریکس کے ماٹریکس عناصر کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے جو پہلے چھپائی موڈیل کے اچھی ا فاسٹ مہربانی اور گریڈینٹ ٹرنکیٹ کے ذریعہ مہربانی سے فیسٹ نے پادشاه عناصر کے انڈکس کو سیکھا۔ سفارش کی طول کے بارے میں کل پیچیدگی $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ سے $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ تک کم کر دی جاتی ہے. مزید آزمائش (طبیعی زبان, دید اور ریاضی) دکھاتے ہیں کہ FSAT نے استاندارد multi-head توجه اور اس کی مختلف طویل سطح کے کاموں میں بہت کم کم کمپیوٹریشن قیمت کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتا ہے اور لانگ رینڈ ارینا بنچم مارک پر نئی ایٹیٹ کا نتیجہ حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Tự chú ý đã được cho thấy là một phương pháp hiệu quả để nắm bắt phụ thuộc hoàn cảnh to àn trong việc tạo mẫu chuỗi, nhưng nó chịu đựng tính phức tạp phần tư trong thời gian và sử dụng trí nhớ. Do sự phân tán của ma trận chú ý, sự tính to án rất nhiều là thừa thải. Do đó, trên tờ giấy này, chúng tôi thiết kế một kiến trúc biến hình hiệu quả, tên là Fourier Spade Attention for transformer (FSB), for fast long-range sequence modelling. Chúng tôi cung cấp một viễn cảnh mới để thiết lập ma trận chú ý thoáng đãng, tức là làm cho mặt trận chú ý thoáng đãng dễ đoán. Hai mô- đun phụ lõi là: 1) Mô- đun chữ thập bí mật chuyển dạng chạy nhanh Fourier, which captures and pools $Nóng 2., các chuỗi phân biệt chữ liên tục trong chữ liên tục (2) Mô- đun ước tính ma trận chú ý thoáng đãng, nó dự đoán các yếu tố thống trị của ma trận chú ý dựa trên sản xuất của mô- đun chữ thập ẩn trước. Nhờ phân tích lại và cắt giảm dốc, FSB đã thành công trong việc nghiên cứu các yếu tố thống trị. Sự phức tạp tổng thể về chiều dài chuỗi được giảm từ l., to án học (L/2) cho đến: \\ Toán (O). Những thí nghiệm bao quát (ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, tầm nhìn, và toán học) cho thấy rằng FSB hoàn toàn vượt trội hơn hẳn các tập trung đa đầu tiêu chuẩn và biến thể của nó trong các công việc dài liền với mức tính thấp, và đạt kết quả mới trên tiêu chuẩn Đấu trường Trường Long Trường.', 'uz': "Name Muhimlik matrikasining kichkina darajasi sababi, ko'p hisoblash qisqa. Hullas, bu qogʻozdagi biz qisqa cheksiz modeli uchun Afer Sparse Animatsiya (FSAT) nomli ajratilgan texnologiyani yaratishimiz mumkin. Biz kichkina paydo matrikasini yaratish uchun yangi qo'llanmalar qo'shiladi, balki kichkina paydo matrikasi ishlab chiqarishi mumkin. Ikki tub modullar: (1) Yashirilgan holat cross modulida tez oʻzgarishlar, va vaqt murakkablarida $L^2$ semantik kompyuterni olib tashlash va qisqartirish $L^2$ qismi kompyuterlarini qisqaradi. Name @ info Ketma- ketlikning umumiy murakkab, $mathcal {O}(L^2)$ ga $\\mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$ kamaytirilgan. Extensive experiments (natural language, vision, and math) show that FSAT remarkably outperforms the standard multi-head attention and its variants in various long-sequence tasks with low computational costs, and achieves new state-of-the-art results on the Long Range Arena benchmark.", 'bg': 'Механизмът за самовнимание е доказан като ефективен подход за улавяне на глобални контекстни зависимости в последователно моделиране, но страда от квадратна сложност в използването на време и памет. Поради рядкостта на матрицата на вниманието, много изчисления са излишни. Ето защо, в тази статия ние проектираме ефективна архитектура на трансформаторите, наречена Фурие Спешно внимание за трансформатори (ФСАТ), за бързо моделиране на последователността от дълги разстояния. Ние осигуряваме чисто нова перспектива за изграждане на рядка матрица на вниманието, т.е. да направим тази матрица предсказуема. Два основни подмодула са: (1) Бърз модул на базата на Фурие трансформация, който улавя и обединява семантични комбинации $L^2$ в $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ времева сложност. (2) Модул за оценка на рядката матрица на вниманието, който прогнозира доминиращите елементи на матрицата на вниманието въз основа на изхода на предишния кръстосан модул със скрито състояние. Чрез репараметеризация и градиентно съкращаване ФСАТ успешно научи индекса на доминиращите елементи. Общата сложност на дължината на последователността се намалява от $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ на $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Обширни експерименти (естествен език, визия и математика) показват, че значително превъзхожда стандартното многоглаво внимание и неговите варианти в различни задачи от дълги последователности с ниски изчислителни разходи и постига нови най-съвременни резултати по референтния показател на Арена на дълги разстояния.', 'hr': 'Pokazano je da je mehanizam samopouzdanja učinkovit pristup uhvativanju globalnih kontekstskih zavisnosti u modelima sekvence, ali pati od kvadratske kompleksnosti u vremenu i uporabi pamćenja. Zbog svjetlosti pažnje matrice, mnogo računala je prepuna. Stoga, u ovom papiru, dizajniramo učinkovitu arhitekturu transformera po imenu Fourier Sparse pažnju za transformer (FSAT), za brzu modeliranje sekvencije dugog raspona. Mi pružamo potpuno novu perspektivu za konstrukciju rezervne pažnje matrice, tj. činiti rezervnu pažnju matricu predvidljivom. Dva jezgra podmodula su: (1) Brza transformacija Fouriera bazirana na skrivenom stanju prekršenom modulu, koji uhvati i bazene semantične kombinacije $L^2$ u $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ vremenske kompleksnosti. (2) Modul procjene rezervne pažnje matrice, koji predviđa dominantne elemente pažnje matrice na temelju izlaza prethodnog skrivenog stanja prekršnog modula. Reparameterizacijom i truncacijom gradienta, FSAT je uspješno naučio indeks dominantnih elementa. Ukupna kompleksnost o dužini sekvencije smanjuje se od $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ na $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Prošireni eksperimenti (prirodni jezik, vizija i matematika) pokazuju da FSAT izuzetno nadmašuje standardnu multiglavnu pažnju i varijante u različitim dugoročnim zadatkima s niskim računalnim troškovima, te postiže nove rezultate umjetnosti na kriteriji Long Range Arena.', 'da': 'Selvopmærksomhedsmekanisme har vist sig at være en effektiv tilgang til at fange globale kontekstafhængigheder i sekvensmodellering, men den lider af kvadratisk kompleksitet i tid og hukommelse brug. På grund af den sparsomme opmærksomhedsmatriks, er meget beregning overflødig. Derfor designer vi i denne artikel en effektiv transformatorarkitektur, kaldet Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), til hurtig seriemodellering med lang rækkevidde. Vi giver et helt nyt perspektiv til at opbygge sparsom opmærksomhed matrix, dvs. at gøre sparsom opmærksomhed matrix forudsigelig. To centrale undermoduler er: (1) En hurtig Fourier transformation baseret skjult tilstand kryds modul, som fanger og samler $L^2$ semantiske kombinationer i $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ tidskompleksitet. (2) Et sparsom opmærksomheds matrix estimeringsmodul, som forudsiger dominerende elementer i en opmærksomheds matrix baseret på output fra det tidligere skjulte tilstands krydsmodul. Ved reparameterisering og gradient trunkering lærte FSAT med succes indekset for dominerende elementer. Den samlede kompleksitet omkring sekvenslængden reduceres fra $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ til $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Omfattende eksperimenter (naturligt sprog, vision og matematik) viser, at FSAT bemærkelsesværdigt overgår standard multi-head opmærksomhed og dens varianter i forskellige langsekvensopgaver med lave beregningsomkostninger, og opnår nye state-of-the-art resultater på Long Range Arena benchmark.', 'de': 'Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus hat sich als effektiver Ansatz für die Erfassung globaler Kontextabhängigkeiten in der Sequenzmodellierung erwiesen, leidet jedoch unter quadratischer Komplexität in der Zeit- und Speichernutzung. Aufgrund der spärlichen Aufmerksamkeitsmatrix ist viel Rechenaufwand überflüssig. Daher entwerfen wir in diesem Beitrag eine effiziente Transformatorarchitektur namens Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), für schnelle Langstreckenfolgenmodelle. Wir bieten eine brandneue Perspektive für die Konstruktion einer spärlichen Aufmerksamkeitsmatrix, d.h. die spärliche Aufmerksamkeitsmatrix vorhersagbar zu machen. Zwei Kern-Untermodule sind: (1) Ein schnelles Fourier-Transformations-basiertes Hidden State Cross Modul, das semantische Kombinationen $L^2$ in $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ Zeitkomplexität erfasst und bündelt. (2) Ein Sparse Aufmerksamkeitsmatrix Schätzmodul, das dominante Elemente einer Aufmerksamkeitsmatrix basierend auf der Ausgabe des vorherigen versteckten Zustandskreuzmoduls vorhersagt. Durch Reparameterisierung und Gradientenschneidung lernte FSAT erfolgreich den Index dominanter Elemente. Die Gesamtkomplexität der Sequenzlänge wird von $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ auf $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$reduziert. Umfangreiche Experimente (natürliche Sprache, Vision und Mathematik) zeigen, dass FSAT die standardmäßige Mehrkopfaufmerksamkeit und ihre Varianten bei verschiedenen Aufgaben mit langen Sequenzen mit niedrigen Rechenkosten deutlich übertrifft und neue State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse auf dem Long Range Arena Benchmark erzielt.', 'id': 'Mekanisme perhatian diri telah terbukti sebagai pendekatan efektif untuk menangkap dependensi konteks global dalam modeling urutan, tetapi menderita kompleksitas kuadratik dalam waktu dan penggunaan memori. Karena kecepatan matriks perhatian, banyak komputasi tidak berguna. Oleh karena itu, di kertas ini, kami merancang arsitektur Transformer yang efisien, bernama Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), untuk model urutan jarak panjang cepat. Kami menyediakan perspektif baru untuk membangun matriks perhatian yang sedikit, i.e. membuat matriks perhatian yang sedikit dapat diprediksi. Dua sub-modul inti adalah: (1) A fast Fourier transform based hidden state cross module, which captures and pools $L^2$ semantic combinations in $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ time complexity. (2) Modul penilaian matriks perhatian ringan, yang memprediksi elemen dominan dari matriks perhatian berdasarkan keluaran dari modul salib keadaan tersembunyi sebelumnya. By reparameterization and gradient truncation, FSAT successfully learned the index of dominant elements.  Kompleksitas umum tentang panjang urutan dikurangi dari $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ ke $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Eksperimen luas (bahasa alami, penglihatan dan matematika) menunjukkan bahwa FSAT luar biasa melampaui perhatian standar multi-kepala dan variasinya dalam berbagai tugas urutan panjang dengan biaya komputasi rendah, dan mencapai hasil terbaru pada benchmark Long Range Arena.', 'ko': '자체 주의 메커니즘은 서열 모델링에서 전역 상하문 의존 관계를 얻는 효과적인 방법으로 증명되었지만, 시간과 메모리 사용에 있어 2차 복잡성이 존재한다.행렬의 희소성에 주의하기 때문에, 대량의 계산은 불필요한 것이다.따라서 본고에서 우리는 푸리엽 희소 변압기 주의(FSAT)라는 효율적인 변압기 구조를 설계하여 빠른 원격 서열 모델링에 사용했다.우리는 희소 주의 행렬을 구축하기 위해 새로운 시각을 제공했다. 설령 희소 주의 행렬이 예측성이 있다 하더라도.두 핵심 서브 모듈은 (1) 빠른 부립엽 변환을 기반으로 하는 숨겨진 상태 교차 모듈입니다. $\\mathcal{O} (L\\log L) $시간 복잡도로 $L^2$의미를 포획하고 집합합니다.(2) 희소 주의 매트릭스 추정 모듈, 이 모듈은 이전에 숨겨진 상태 교차 모듈의 출력 예측 주의 매트릭스의 주도 요소를 바탕으로 한다.FSAT는 매개 변수화 및 계단식 절단을 통해 주도 요소의 지수를 성공적으로 학습했습니다.전체 시퀀스 복잡성은 $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$에서 $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$로 감소합니다.대량의 실험(자연언어, 시각과 수학)에 의하면 FSAT는 각종 긴 서열 임무에서 비교적 낮은 계산 원가로 표준의 다중 주의와 변체보다 현저히 우수하고 원격 경기장 기준에서 최신 결과를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa kujitegemea umeonyesha kuwa njia yenye ufanisi wa kutafuta mazingira ya dunia kutegemea kwa mifano ya mfululizo, lakini inaumia vigumu kwa muda na matumizi ya kumbukumbu. Kutokana na kuongezeka kwa mfumo wa kutangaza, hisabu nyingi imepungua. Kwa hiyo, katika gazeti hili, tunaunda ujenzi wenye ufanisi wa Tafsiri, anayeitwa Mara ya Sparse kwa ajili ya Kutafsiri (FSAT), kwa mfano wa mfululizo wa muda mrefu. Tunatoa mtazamo mpya wa kujenga matrix ya uchunguzi, yaani kufanya matrix ya kuchanganyikiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa unaotabiriwa. Vifaa viwili vya chini ni: (1) mabadiliko ya haraka minne ya mabadiliko yenye asili ya utawala wa serikali, ambayo yanachukua na kupunguza viungo vya dola L^2 za kimapenzi katika $\\mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$ tatizo la muda. (2) Kifaa cha uchunguzi cha kuchukua vifaa vya kuchukua hisia, ambacho kinaonyesha vipengele muhimu vya ufuatiliaji kinachotokana na matokeo ya kipande kilichofichwa cha serikali. Kwa kutengeneza mabadiliko na mabadiliko yenye msimamo mkali, FSAT ilifanikiwa kujifunza mfululizo wa vipengele vya madaraka. Utatibu mkubwa kuhusu urefu wa mfululizo umepunguzwa kutoka $\\mathcal {O}(L^2)$\\mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$. Extensive experiments (natural language, vision, and math) show that FSAT remarkably outperforms the standard multi-head attention and its variants in various long-sequence tasks with low computational costs, and achieves new state-of-the-art results on the Long Range Arena benchmark.', 'fa': 'مکانیسم خود توجه به عنوان یک روش موثری برای گرفتن بستگی\u200cهای محیط جهانی در مدل\u200cسازی، نشان داده شده است، اما از پیچیدگی چهارداریک در زمان و استفاده حافظه رنج می\u200cدهد. به دلیل کمی از ماتریکس توجه، محاسبات زیادی کمتر نیست. بنابراین، در این کاغذ، ما یک معماری تغییر\u200cدهنده موثرت را طراحی می\u200cکنیم، به نام Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT) برای مدل\u200cسازی مدل طولانی. ما یک دیدگاه جدید برای ساختن ماتریکس توجه کوچک را پیش بینی می\u200cدهیم، یعنی ماتریکس توجه کوچک را پیش بینی می\u200cکنیم. دو مدول زیر اصلی اینه: (1) یک مدول مخفی موقعیت پنهان بر اساس فوریر تغییر می\u200cدهد که در $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ زمان پیچیدگی زمان می\u200cگیرد و دریافت می\u200cکند. (۲) یک مدول مقدار توجه ماتریکس کوچک، که عناصر فرمانروایی یک ماتریکس توجه را پیش بینی می\u200cکند، بر اساس نتیجه مدول مخفی موقعیت پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند. با تغییر تغییر اندازه و تغییر گرادیر، FSAT با موفقیت نشانهٔ عناصر فرمانروایی را یاد گرفت. کل پیچیدگی درباره طول ترکیب از $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ به $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ کاهش می\u200cشود. آزمایش\u200cهای زیادی (زبان طبیعی، دید و ریاضی) نشان می\u200cدهند که FSAT به طور کامل توجه چندین سر استاندارد و تغییرات آن را در کار\u200cهای طولانی با هزینه\u200cهای کم محاسبه\u200cی محاسبه\u200cای انجام می\u200cدهد، و نتیجه\u200cهای موجود هنری جدید روی تغییر ارینا طولانی می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Self-aandag-mekanisme is vertoon om 'n effektief toegang te wees vir die opvang van globale konteks afhanklikhede in sekwensiemodeling, maar dit lyf van quadratic kompleksiteit in tyd en geheue gebruik. Dus die sparsiteit van die aandag matriks, is baie rekenaar herduldig. Daarom, in hierdie papier, ontwerp ons 'n effektief Transformer-arkitektuur, genaamd Fourier Sparse Aansig vir Transformer (FSAT), vir vinnige lang omvang volgorde modeling. Ons verskaf 'n brand-nuwe perspektief vir die konstruksie van sparse aandag matriks, i.e. die sparse aandag matriks voorskoubaar. Twee kern sub- modules is: (1) ' n vinnige Fourier transformeer gebaseerde staat kruismodule, wat opvang en pools $L^2$ semantiese kombinasies in $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ tyd kompleksiteit. (2) â\x80\x99n sparse aandag matriks estimatie module, wat voorskou dominante elemente van â\x80\x99n aandag matriks gebaseer op die uitvoer van die vorige verborge staat kruismodule. Deur reparameterisasie en gradient truncation, FSAT suksesvol leer die indeks van dominante elemente. Die hele kompleksiteit oor die volgorde lengte is verduur van $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ na $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Ekstensiewe eksperimente (natuurlike taal, sien en matematiek) wys dat FSAT betekeurig die standaard multikop aandag en sy variante in verskillende lang sekwensies opdragte met lae rekenasiekoste, en bereik nuwe staat-van-die-kunstens resultate op die Lang Range Arena benchmark.", 'nl': 'Het zelfaandachtsmechanisme is een effectieve benadering gebleken voor het vastleggen van globale context afhankelijkheden in sequentiemodellering, maar het lijdt aan kwadratische complexiteit in tijd en geheugen gebruik. Door de schaarse aandachtsmatrix is veel berekening overbodig. Daarom ontwerpen we in dit artikel een efficiënte Transformer architectuur, genaamd Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), voor snelle langeafstands sequentiemodeling. We bieden een gloednieuw perspectief voor het bouwen van een spaarzame aandachtsmatrix, dat wil zeggen het voorspelbaar maken van de spaarzame aandachtsmatrix. Twee kernsubmodules zijn: (1) Een snelle Fourier transformatie gebaseerde hidden state cross module, die $L^2$ semantische combinaties vastlegt en bundelt in $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ tijdcomplexiteit. (2) Een schaarse aandachtsmatrix schattingsmodule, die dominante elementen van een aandachtsmatrix voorspelt op basis van de output van de vorige verborgen toestand kruismodule. Door herseparameterisatie en gradiëntverkorting leerde FSAT met succes de index van dominante elementen. De algehele complexiteit van de volglengte wordt verminderd van $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ naar $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Uitgebreide experimenten (natuurlijke taal, visie en wiskunde) tonen aan dat FSAT de standaard multi-head aandacht en zijn varianten opmerkelijk overtreft in verschillende lange-sequentie taken met lage rekenkosten, en nieuwe state-of-the-art resultaten behaalt op de Long Range Arena benchmark.', 'sq': 'Mekanizmi i vetëvëmendjes është treguar se është një qasje efektive për kapjen e varësive të kontekstit global në modelimin e sekuencës, por vuan nga kompleksiteti kuadratik në kohën dhe përdorimin e kujtesës. Për shkak të pakësisë së matricës së vëmendjes, shumë llogaritje janë të tepërta. Therefore, in this paper, we design an efficient Transformer architecture, named Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), for fast long-range sequence modeling.  We provide a brand-new perspective for constructing sparse attention matrix, i.e. making the sparse attention matrix predictable.  Dy nënmodule thelbësore janë: (1) Një modul i shpejtë i transformimit të Fourier-it bazuar në gjendjen e fshehtë të kryqëzimit, i cili kap dhe mbledh kombinime semantike $L^2$ në kompleksitetin e kohës $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Një modul vlerësimi i matricës së paktë vëmendjeje, i cili parashikon elementet dominuese të një matrice vëmendjeje bazuar në daljen e modulit të mëparshëm të kryqëzimit të shtetit të fshehur. Nga ripameterizimi dhe shkurtimi i gradient ëve, FSAT mësoi me sukses indeksin e elementeve dominante. Kompleksia e përgjithshme rreth gjatësisë së sekuencës është reduktuar nga $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ në $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara (gjuhë natyrore, vizion dhe matematika) tregojnë se FSAT kryen në mënyrë të konsiderueshme vëmendjen standarte me shumë koka dhe variantet e saj në detyra të ndryshme me sekuenca të gjata me kosto të ulëta llogaritare dhe arrin rezultate të reja më të larta në normën e Arenës së Distancës së Lartë.', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ ինքնաուշադրության մեխանիզմը արդյունավետ մոտեցում է գլոբալ կոնտեքստի կախվածությունների բռնումը հաջորդականության մոդելավորման մեջ, բայց այն տառապում է ժամանակի և հիշողության քառակուսի բարդությունից: Ուշադրության մատրիքսի հազվադեպության պատճառով շատ հաշվարկներ անհրաժեշտ են: Այսպիսով, այս թղթի մեջ մենք ձևավորում ենք արդյունավետ տրանսֆերմերների ճարտարապետություն, որը կոչվում է Ֆյուրիեր Անվճար ուշադրություն տրանսֆերմերների համար (ՖՍԹ), արագ երկար հեռավորության մոդելավորման համար: Մենք տրամադրում ենք նոր տեսանկյուն, որպեսզի կառուցենք փոքրիկ ուշադրության մատրիքսը, այսինքն՝ փոքրիկ ուշադրության մատրիքսը կանխատեսելի դարձնենք: Երկու հիմնական ենթամոդուլներ են․ (1) արագ Foureer-ի վերափոխման հիմնված թաքնված վիճակի խաչված մոդուլը, որը գրավում է և հավաքում $L^2$ սեմանտիկ համադրումները $\\mathical{O}(L\\lock L)$ ժամանակի բարդության մեջ։ (2) Ուշադրության մատրիքսի հաշվարկման մոդուլը, որը կանխատեսում է ուշադրության մատրիքսի գերիշխող տարրերը, հիմնված նախորդ թաքնված վիճակի խաչված մոդուլների արտադրության վրա: Վերմետրիզացիայի և դասավորման միջոցով, ՖՍԹ-ը հաջողությամբ սովորեց գերիշխող տարրերի ինդեքսը: Հաջորդականության երկարության ընդհանուր բարդությունը նվազեցվում է $\\mathical{O}(L^2)$ և $\\mathical{O}(L\\lock L)$: Շատ լայն փորձարկումները (բնական լեզու, տեսողություն և մաթեմատիկա) ցույց են տալիս, որ ՖՍԹ-ն արտահայտում է շատ գլխավոր ուշադրությունը և դրա տարբերակները տարբեր երկար հաջորդականության խնդիրներում, որոնք ցածր հաշվարկների արժեքներ ունեն, և հասնում է նոր ամենակարևոր արդյունքներ երկար դաշտի', 'az': 'Öz təhlükəsizlik mehanizmisi, sıralıq modellərində küresel kontekst bağlılıqlarını almaq üçün etkili bir yol göstərildi, amma o, zamanda və yada istifadəsində kvadratik kompleksitədən çəkilir. Dikkati matriksinin küçük səbəbi, çox hesablama çox azaldı. Buna görə də bu kağızda, çox uzaq səviyyənin modellik üçün, Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT) adlı bir Transformer arhitektarını tasarlayırıq. Biz küçük məlumat matriksini inşa etmək üçün yeni bir perspektiv təmin edirik, yani küçük məlumat matriksini təmin edirik. İki nütfədə apa moduludur: (1) Hızlı Fourier gizli durum modülünü dəyişdirir ki, $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ saat kompleksitəsində $L^2$ semantik kombinatsiyalarını alır və qoyur. (2) Əvvəlki gizli vəziyyətdə keçmiş modülin çıxarılmasına dayanan, dikkati matriklərin dominantlı elementlərini təmin edir. Səfəramiterizasyon və gradient dəyişməsi ilə FSAT dominant elementlərin indeksünü başarılı olaraq öyrəndi. Seyir uzunluğunun bütün kompleksitəsi $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ tərəfindən $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ tərəfindən azaldır. Əlavə təcrübələr (təbiətli dil, görünüş və matematik) FSAT standart çoxlu başlıqlarını və onun variablarını düşük hesap maliyyəti ilə müxtəlif uzun-sürəkli işlərdə istifadə edir və uzun Range Arena benchmarkində yeni sanat sonuçlarını başa çatdırır.', 'tr': '횜z 체nsli mekanizmasy d체n첵채b kontekst baglyklaryny d체힊체rmek 체챌in etkinlik ta첵첵arlandyrylyp g철rkezildi, 첵철ne ol wagty흫 we 첵agda첵 ullanlygynda kvadratik kompleksiteden bolup g철r체n첵채r. Dikkatin matrisin k체챌체ms체zl체휓체 y체z체nden, 챌ok hesaplamak bo힊luydu. 힇ol seb채pli, bu kagyzda, biz t채sirli transformer arhitekturlygy tasarla첵arl첵arys, ady Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), tiz uzak interval dizini modellendirmek 체챌in. Dikkatini 챌ekmek i 챌in yeni bir marka perspektive sunuyoruz, yani, k체챌체k bir matris tahmin edilebilir. - Iki sany alt mod체li 힊ol: (1) 횉altly Fourier gizli durum mod체li 체첵tgedir. Bu $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ zamany흫 karma힊캇klygynda $L^2$ semantik kombinasyonlary 챌eker we 체첵tgedir. (2) Bir 챌ekici matris tahmin modulu, bu da 철nceki gizli durum kar힊캇la힊t캇rma modulunun 챌izgisine dayanan dominant elementlerini tahmin edir. Yeniden par챌alanma ve d챕gradyo y체kselmesine g철re, FSAT dominant elementlerin indeksini ba힊ar캇yla 철휓rendi. Hat uzantygyny흫 b체tin karma힊캇klygy $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ tarapyndan $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ 체챌in d체힊체rildi. D철wletli deneyler (tebigat dili, g철rn체힊 we matematik) FSAT k철p g철rn체힊ini흫 derejesini 첵ok hasaplamagy bilen k철p g철rn체힊leri we 철z wariantlaryny d체힊체k kalkulary흫 t철wereklerinde 첵ok hasaplan첵ar we uzak Arena netijesinde t채ze hasaplanlygyny 챌ykar첵ar.', 'ca': "S'ha demostrat que el mecanisme d'auto-atenció és un enfocament eficaç per capturar les dependències del contexte global en la modelació de seqüències, però pateix complexitat quadràtica en l'ús del temps i la memòria. Due to the sparsity of the attention matrix, much computation is redundant.  Així doncs, en aquest article dissenyem una arquitectura Transformer eficient, anomenada Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), per modelar seqüències a llarg distància ràpida. Ens proporcionem una perspectiva completament nova per construir una matriu d'atenció escasa, és a dir, fer previsible la matriu d'atenció escasa. Dos sub-móduls fonamentals són: (1) Un módul d'estat ocult basat en transformació rápida de Fourier, que captura i agrupa combinacions semàntiques de $L^2$ en complexitat de temps de $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Un módul d'estimació de la matriu d'atenció escasa, que prediu elements dominants d'una matriu d'atenció basat en la producció del módul d'estat ocult anterior. A través de la reparameterització i la truncació gradient, FSAT va aprendre amb èxit l'índex d'elements dominants. La complexitat global sobre la llargada de la seqüència es redueix de $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ a $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Els extensos experiments (llenguatge natural, visió i matemàtiques) mostren que FSAT supera notablement l'atenció standard multicapa i les seves variants en diverses tasques de llarga seqüència amb baixos costos computacionals, i aconsegueix nous resultats d'última generació a l'arena de Long Range.", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মনোযোগ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে বিশ্বব্যাপী প্রেক্ষাপটের নির্ভর করার জন্য এক কার্যকর উপায় হিসেবে, কিন্তু সময় এবং মেমরি ব্যবহারের সময়ে এটি ক মনোযোগ ম্যাট্রিক্সের স্প্রাইজের কারণে অনেক গণনা কম। তাই এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি দক্ষ ট্রান্সফার্নাফারের স্প্যান্সার ফর ট্রান্সফার (এফএসটি) নামে একটি কার্যকর পরিকল্পনা করি যার নাম দ্রুত দীর আমরা ব্র্যান্ড-নতুন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দিচ্ছি স্প্যান্সের মনোযোগ ম্যাট্রিক্স নির্মাণের জন্য, যেমন স্প্যাস ম্যাট্রি দুই মূল সাব-মডিউল হলো: (1) একটি দ্রুত রাষ্ট্রীয় ক্রাস মডিউল ভিত্তিক স্থানীয় চারটি রূপান্তর, যা দ্রুত রাষ্ট্রের ক্রাস মডিউলে আটকে রাখে এবং পুলে করে $L^2 মাথ্ (2) পূর্ববর্তী লুকানো রাষ্ট্রীয় ক্রস মডিউলের আউটপুট ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে একটি মনোযোগ মাত্রিক উপাদানের প্রধান উপাদান উপলব্ধি করে। ফ্রামেটারিজেশন এবং গ্রেডিয়েন্ড ট্রাঙ্কেশনের মাধ্যমে এফএসট সফলভাবে প্রাধান্য উপাদানের সূচনা শিখেছে। সেকেন্সের দীর্ঘ সম্পর্কে সম্পূর্ণ জটিলতা $mathcal {O}(L^2)$ থেকে $mathcal {O}(L\\log L)$ থেকে কমিয়ে দেয়। বিস্তৃত পরীক্ষা (প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা, দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং গবেষণা) দেখাচ্ছে যে এফএসটি বিশেষ করে দেখিয়েছে যে দীর্ঘ পর্যায়ের দীর্ঘমাত্রার বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘ পরিমাণের মাধ্যমে স্বাভা', 'bs': 'Pokazano je da je mehanizam samopouzdanja efikasan pristup uhvativanju globalnih kontekstskih zavisnosti u modelima sekvence, ali pati od kvadratske kompleksnosti u vremenu i upotrebi pamćenja. Zbog svjetlosti pažnje matrice, mnogo računala je prepuna. Stoga, u ovom papiru, dizajniramo efikasnu arhitekturu transformera po imenu Fourier Sparse pažnju za transformer (FSAT), za modelizaciju brzog rasporeda. Mi pružamo potpuno novu perspektivu za konstrukciju rezervne pažnje matrice, tj. da predvidimo rezervnu pažnju matricu. Dva jezgra podmodula su: (1) Brza transformacija Fouriera bazirana na skrivenom stanju prekršenom modulu, koji uhvati i bazene semantične kombinacije $L^2$ u $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ vremenske kompleksnosti. (2) Modul procjene rezervne pažnje matrice, koji predviđa dominantne elemente pažnje matrice na temelju izlaza prethodnog skrivenog stanja prekršnog modula. Reparameterizacijom i truncacijom gradienta, FSAT je uspješno naučio indeks dominantnih elementa. Ukupna kompleksnost o dužini sekvence se smanjuje od $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ na $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Eksperimenti (prirodni jezik, vizija i matematika) pokazuju da FSAT izuzetno nadmašuje standardnu multiglavnu pažnju i varijante u različitim dugoročnim zadatkima sa niskim računalnim troškovima i ostvaruje nove rezultate umjetnosti na kriteriji Long Range Arena.', 'cs': 'Mechanismus sebe-pozornosti byl prokázán jako efektivní přístup k zachycení globálních kontextových závislostí v sekvenčním modelování, ale trpí kvadratickou složitostí v čase a paměti. Vzhledem k řídkosti matice pozornosti je mnoho výpočtů redundantní. Proto v tomto článku navrhujeme efektivní architekturu transformátoru s názvem Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT) pro rychlé modelování sekvencí na dlouhém dosahu. Poskytujeme zcela nový pohled na konstruování řídké pozornostní matice, tj. udělat řídkou pozornostní matici předvídatelnou. Dva jádrové podmoduly jsou: (1) Rychlý skrytý stavový křížový modul založený na Fourierově transformaci, který zachycuje a sdružuje sémantické kombinace $L^2$ v časové složitosti $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ . (2) Odhadovací modul řídké matice pozornosti, který předpovídá dominantní prvky matice pozornosti na základě výstupu předchozího skrytého křížového modulu. Pomocí reprameterizace a zkrácení gradientů se FSAT úspěšně naučil index dominantních prvků. Celková složitost délky sekvence je snížena z $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ na $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Rozsáhlé experimenty (přirozený jazyk, vidění a matematika) ukazují, že FSAT pozoruhodně překonává standardní vícehlavovou pozornost a její varianty v různých dlouhých sekvencích úlohách s nízkými výpočetními náklady a dosahuje nových nejmodernějších výsledků na benchmarku Long Range Arena.', 'am': 'የራሳቸውን ማስታወቂያ ማሰናከል በዓለምአቀፍ ጥናት በሚያሰኘው ምሳሌ ነው፡፡ በጥያቄው ማትሪክ ምክንያት ብዙው ቁጥጥር ቀላል ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም በዚህ ካላት፣ ለብዙ ረጅም ስርዓት ምሳሌ የተባለውን አራር ስፓርስ ትዕዛዝ (FSAT) የሚጠራውን የአፍሪካዊ መሠረት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ የጥያቄ ትኩረት ማትሪክን ለመሥራት እናስባለን፡፡ በ. (2) የቀድሞው የሥርዓት ጉዳይ ክፍል በተደረገ የአካባቢው ሚትሪክ የሥልጣን አካላትን በመጠቀም የሚቆጠር ምርጫዎች በአካባቢው እና በአካባቢው አካል ማውጣት የFSAT ማውቀትን በሙሉ ፍላጎት ተማረ፡፡ The overall complexity about the sequence length is reduced from $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ to $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$.  ብዙ ፈተናዎች (ፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ፣ ራእይ እና math) የFSAT ድጋፍ የብዛት ራስ ትኩረት እና ለውጦቹን በተለያዩ የረጅም ቁጥጥር ውጤቶች በሚያሳየው፣ የረጅም ደረጃ አርእስት አርእስት ላይ አዲስ ክፍተት አግኝቷል፡፡', 'fi': 'Itsehuomiomekanismin on osoitettu olevan tehokas tapa kuvata globaaleja kontekstin riippuvuuksia sekvenssimallinnassa, mutta se kärsii kvadraattisesta monimutkaisuudesta ajan ja muistin käytössä. Huomiomatriisin niukkuuden vuoksi paljon laskentaa on tarpeetonta. Siksi tässä työssä suunnittelemme tehokkaan muuntaja-arkkitehtuurin, Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), nopeaan pitkän kantaman sekvenssimallitukseen. Tarjoamme upouuden näkökulman harvaan huomiomatriisin rakentamiseen eli harvaan huomiomatriisin tekemiseen ennustettavaksi. Kaksi ydinalamoduulia ovat: (1) Nopea Fourier-muunnokseen perustuva piilotetun tilan ristimoduuli, joka kerää ja yhdistää $L^2$ semanttisia yhdistelmiä $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$-aikamonimutkaisuuteen. (2) Harjan huomiomatriisin estimointimoduuli, joka ennustaa huomiomatriisin hallitsevia elementtejä edellisen piilotetun tilan ristimoduulin tuotoksen perusteella. Uudelleenkorjaamalla ja gradientin lyhentämällä FSAT oppi menestyksekkäästi hallitsevien elementtien indeksin. Sekvenssin pituuden kokonaismonimutkaisuus pienenee $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ arvoon $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Laajat kokeet (luonnollinen kieli, visio ja matematiikka) osoittavat, että FSAT suoriutuu huomattavasti tavanomaisen monipäisen huomion ja sen varianttien paremmin erilaisissa pitkän sarjan tehtävissä alhaisilla laskennallisilla kustannuksilla ja saavuttaa uusia huipputason tuloksia Long Range Arena -benchmarkissa.', 'et': 'Enesetähelepanu mehhanism on näidanud olevat efektiivne lähenemisviis globaalsete kontekstisõltuvuste jäädvustamiseks järjestuse modelleerimisel, kuid see kannatab ruutmeetrilise keerukuse tõttu aja ja mälu kasutamisel. Tähelepanu maatriksi vähesuse tõttu on palju arvutusi üleliigne. Seetõttu kujundame käesolevas töös efektiivse transformaatori arhitektuuri nimega Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT) kiireks pikaajaliseks jada modelleerimiseks. Pakume täiesti uut perspektiivi hõreda tähelepanu maatriksi ehitamiseks ehk hõreda tähelepanu maatriksi prognoositavaks muutmiseks. Kaks põhilist alammoodulit on: (1) kiire Fourieri teisendusel põhinev peidetud oleku ristmoodul, mis tabab ja koondab $L^2$ semantilised kombinatsioonid ajakeerukuses $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) Hõreda tähelepanu maatriksi hindamise moodul, mis ennustab tähelepanu maatriksi domineerivaid elemente eelmise peidetud oleku ristmooduli väljundi põhjal. Remorametriseerimise ja gradientide kärpimise abil õppis FSAT edukalt domineerivate elementide indeksi. Järjekorra pikkuse üldine keerukus väheneb $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$-lt $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$-ni. Laiaulatuslikud eksperimendid (looduskeel, nägemine ja matemaatika) näitavad, et FSAT suudab märkimisväärselt üle standardse mitmepealise tähelepanu ja selle variandid erinevates pikaajalistes ülesannetes madalate arvutuskuludega ning saavutab uued tipptasemel tulemused Long Range Arena võrdlusalusel.', 'jv': "Self-awak mekanistik iki dipontrolan kanggo ngubah akeh efek kanggo ngilangno sistem sing di nggawe kontinuksi dipatensi ning sekondirne dipatensi, ngubah iso dianggo kelangan kelangan sampeyan kanggo ngubah ujar lan pangan. Genjer-genjer Kaya, ning alih iki, awak dhéwé nggawe akeh Transformer architecture effisif, jeneng phoriar Spars Attention kanggo Transformer (WSAT), kanggo ngawe barang sistem sistem sistem sistem sawar. So that's it. Two coral Sub-modules are: (1) A fast FOURIR transform supported hidden state krus module, that Captes and pool$L^ semanti c combinings in $matcal {O}(L\\log L) $time komplicité. (2) A spase awake mattres estemation module, that preambs the domain of an awake mattres basic on the output of the previous hidden state Krot module. Ngubah The underall komplicity about the order length is minimed from %\\matcal {O}(L^2) $to %\\matcal {O}(L\\log L) $. AllProgressBarUpdates", 'ha': "An nuna kanayen kujiɓinci ya zama wata mafiya amfani ga kãma mazaɓa na cikin mazaɗar mutane, kuma amma, yana da amfani da lokacin da ake amfani da kumbar. Dukan tsaurin muhimmanci na matriki, yana ƙara hisãbi mai yawa. Saboda haka, cikin wannan takarda, Munã design an kasar wani matsayin Transformer mai Effective, wanda aka suna Four Space Attemption for Transformer (FSAT), wa misalin mai sauri-tsawo. Tuna samar da wata kalma na'ura don ka sami matriki masu kiyãta masu sauri, misali, za'a iya iya ƙayyade matrikin muhimmada. Tsarin-module biyu masu ƙari sune: (1) Shirin transforma huru ɗaya na baka cikin modulen kore na state wanda aka ɓõye, yana kãma kuma ana ƙara komai da $L^2$ na daidaita cikin $ mathcal[O](L/log L)$ mai adadin lokaci. (2) Ki nuna modulen estimatin matrix na zura ido, wanda ke ƙayyade ƙanshi na masu domin matriki, a kan fitarwa da ke gaba cikin modulen kore ta zaman taƙaita. By reparameterization and gradient truncation, FSAT successfully learned the index of dominant elements.  An ƙara cikakken ƙunci na cikin tsawo daga $ mathcal[O] (L^2)$ zuwa $ mathcal[O](L/log L)$. Akwai jarrabãwa masu ƙaranci (lugha'a, gani, da matsayin) na nuna FSAT yana ƙaranci ƙidãya ga aikin kwanan-nau'in mulki da variants cikin wasu aikin sauran da ke ƙaranci ƙidãyar matsayin da kuma yana sãmu matsayin-na-kunyar-fassara kan Hanyar Arge Long Range.", 'he': 'Self-attention mechanism has been shown to be an effective approach for capturing global context dependencies in sequence modeling, but it suffers from quadratic complexity in time and memory usage.  בגלל הידרות של מטריקס תשומת לב, הרבה מחשב הוא מוגזם. לכן, בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מעצבים ארכיטקטורה יעילה טרנספורטרית, בשם Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), עבור דוגמנית רצף ארוך מהיר. אנו מספקים פרספקטיבה חדשה לגמרי לבנות מטריקס תשומת לב נדיר, כלומר להפוך את מטריקס תשומת לב נדיר צפוי. שני תו-מודולים ליבה הם: (1) שינוי פורייר מהיר מבוסס על מודול מצב חבוי, אשר תופס ובריכה שילובים סמנטיים $ L^2$ במרכיבת זמן $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. (2) מודול הערכת מטריקס תשומת לב נדיר, שמחזה אלמנטים שולטים של מטריקס תשומת לב מבוסס על יציאה של מודול הצלב המסתור הקודם. באמצעות מחדש מטריזציה וחתך גרדיינט, FSAT למד בהצלחה את אינדיקס אלמנטים דומיננטיים. המורכבות הכללית בנוגע לאורך הרצף מופחית מ $\\ mathcal{O}(L^2)$ ל $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. ניסויים רחבים (שפה טבעית, חזון ומתמטיקה) מראים שFSAT מוביל את תשומת הלב המאוחדת הסטנדרטית והשונים שלה במשימות רצפיות ארוכות שונות עם עלות חישובים נמוכות, ולהשיג תוצאות חדשות במדינת ארוחת הרחק.', 'sk': 'Mehanizem samopozornosti se je izkazal za učinkovit pristop pri zajemanju globalnih kontekstnih odvisnosti v modeliranju zaporedja, vendar trpi zaradi kvadratne kompleksnosti pri uporabi časa in pomnilnika. Zaradi redkosti matrike pozornosti je veliko izračunov odvečno. Zato smo v tem članku oblikovali učinkovito arhitekturo transformatorjev, imenovano Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer (FSAT), za hitro modeliranje zaporedja dolgega dosega. Zagotavljamo popolnoma novo perspektivo za gradnjo redke pozornosti matrice, tj. za predvidljivost redke pozornosti matrike. Dva osrednja podmodula sta: (1) hiter Fourierjev prečni modul skritih stanj, ki zajema in združuje semantične kombinacije $L^2$ v $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ časovno kompleksnost. (2) Modul ocenjevanja redke pozornosti matrike, ki napoveduje dominantne elemente pozornosti matrike na podlagi izhoda prejšnjega križnega modula skritih stanj. S reparametrizacijo in gradientnim skrajšanjem se je FSAT uspešno naučil indeksa dominantnih elementov. Splošna kompleksnost dolžine zaporedja se zmanjša z $\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ na $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$. Obsežni eksperimenti (naravni jezik, vizija in matematika) kažejo, da FSAT izjemno presega standardno večglavno pozornost in njene različice pri različnih nalogah dolgega zaporedja z nizkimi računalniškimi stroški in dosega nove najsodobnejše rezultate na merilu Long Range Arena.', 'bo': 'Self-attention mechanism has been shown to be an effective approach for capturing global context dependencies in sequence modeling, but it suffers from quadratic complexity in time and memory usage. གྲངས་རྩིས་མང་ཆེ་བ་མེད་ལ། དེར་བརྟེན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ནུས་ཡུལ་ཅན་གྱི་Transformer architecture་ཞིག་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཅིག་མིང་།Fourier Sparse Attention for Transformer ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏོང་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་གསརཔ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་གི་ཡུལ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། Two core sub-modules are: (1) A fast Fourier transform based hidden state cross module, which captures and pools $L^2$ semantic combinations in $\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ time complexity. (2) A sparse attention matrix estimation module, which predicts dominant elements of an attention matrix based on the output of the previous hidden state cross module. reparameterization and gradient truncation, FSAT successfully learned the index of dominant elements. དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་སྐོར་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་འདི་$\\mathcal{O}(L^2)$ ལས་$\\mathcal{O}(L\\log L)$ དར་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། Extensive experiments (natural language, vision, and math) show that FSAT remarkably outperforms the standard multi-head attention and its variants in various long-sequence tasks with low computational costs, and achieves new state-of-the-art results on the Long Range Arena benchmark.'}
{'en': 'Principled Paraphrase Generation with Parallel Corpora', 'ar': 'تحسين توليد الشرح المخصص من خلال التمثيل المرئي', 'fr': "Améliorer la génération d'explications personnalisées grâce à la visualisation", 'es': 'Mejorar la generación de explicaciones personalizadas mediante la visualización', 'pt': 'Melhorando a geração de explicações personalizadas por meio da visualização', 'ja': '視覚化によるパーソナライズされた説明の生成の向上', 'zh': '因可视化改进个性化解释生成', 'ru': 'Улучшение создания персонализированных объяснений с помощью визуализации', 'hi': 'विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन के माध्यम से व्यक्तिगत स्पष्टीकरण जनरेशन में सुधार', 'ga': 'Giniúint Mhínithe Pearsantaithe a Fheabhsú trí Amharcléiriú', 'hu': 'A személyre szabott magyarázat generálásának javítása vizualizálással', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της δημιουργίας εξατομικευμένων εξηγήσεων μέσω της οπτικοποίησης', 'ka': 'პროცენალიზებული განსწავლება ვიზუალიზაციის გამოყენებით', 'it': 'Migliorare la generazione di spiegazioni personalizzate attraverso la visualizzazione', 'kk': 'Визуализация арқылы жеке түсініктерді жасау', 'lt': 'Patobulinti asmeninio paaiškinimo kūrimą vizualizuojant', 'mk': 'Подобрување на генерацијата на лично објаснување преку визуализација', 'ms': 'Improving Personalized Explanation Generation through Visualization', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിപരമാക്കിയ എക്സ്പ്ലാനേഷന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн Тодорхойлолтын төрөл бүтээгдэхүүнийг үзүүлэхээр', 'no': 'Forbetra oppretting av personaliserte utforsking gjennom visualisering', 'mt': 'Titjib fil-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Spjegazzjoni Personalizzata permezz tal-Viżwalizzazzjoni', 'pl': 'Poprawa spersonalizowanego generowania wyjaśnień poprzez wizualizację', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea generarii de explicații personalizate prin vizualizare', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje generacije osobnog objašnjenja kroz vizualizaciju', 'si': 'පුද්ගලික විශ්වාස කරපු ප්\u200dරකාශනය නිර්මාණය විශාලනය කරන්න', 'so': 'Horumarinta dhalashada qofka loo sharciyey', 'ta': 'தனிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட வெளியீட்டு உருவாக்கத்தை பார்வையிட்டு மேம்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'ویزئولیزی کے ذریعے شخصی تفصیل پیدا کرنے کے لئے', 'sv': 'Förbättra genereringen av personlig förklaring genom visualisering', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường độ giải thích bằng cách nhìn', 'bg': 'Подобряване на генерирането на персонализирани обяснения чрез визуализация', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje generacije osobnog objašnjenja putem vizualizacije', 'da': 'Forbedring af personlig forklaring generering gennem visualisering', 'nl': 'Het genereren van gepersonaliseerde verklaringen verbeteren door visualisatie', 'de': 'Verbesserung der Generierung personalisierter Erklärungen durch Visualisierung', 'ko': '시각화를 통해 개성화된 해석 생성을 개선하다', 'id': 'Menembak Generasi Penjelasan Personalisasi melalui Visualisasi', 'fa': 'بهترین توضیح شخصی از طریق ویژه\u200cسازی', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Uzalishaji wa Maelezo ya watu binafsi kupitia Visualizi', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i gjenerimit të shpjegimit të personalizuar nëpërmjet vizualizimit', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'tr': 'Kişisel Taýýarlama Taryhy Çykarmak Aralygy', 'af': 'Verbeter Persoonaliseerde Verklaring Genereer deur Visualisering', 'hy': 'Անձնական բացատրության ստեղծման բարելավումը վիզուալիզացիայի միջոցով', 'az': 'Şahsiyyətli Açıklama Üretini Görünüllü Yaratılması ilə yaxşılaşdırma', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিগত এক্সপ্ল্যানেশন প্রজন্ম দেখা যাচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje generacije osobnog objašnjenja kroz vizualizaciju', 'ca': "millorar la generació d'explicacions personalitzades a través de la visualització", 'cs': 'Zlepšení generování personalizovaných vysvětlení prostřednictvím vizualizace', 'et': 'Personaalse selgituse genereerimise parandamine visualiseerimise kaudu', 'fi': 'Henkilökohtaisten selitysten luomisen parantaminen visualisoinnin avulla', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje ustvarjanja prilagojenih pojasnil s pomočjo vizualizacije', 'he': 'שיפור ההסבר האישי על ידי ויזואליזציה', 'jv': 'Ngubah Gambarang Pangaran Personalizasi Generasi Perusahaan Visual', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གསར་བསྐྲུན་དེ་ལ་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་བཟོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Round trip Machine Translation MT is a popular choice for paraphrase generation which leverages readily available parallel corpora for supervision In this paper we formalize the implicit similarity function induced by this approach and show that it is susceptible to non paraphrase pairs sharing a single ambiguous translation Based on these insights we design an alternative similarity metric that mitigates this issue by requiring the entire translation distribution to match and implement a relaxation of it through the Information Bottleneck method Our approach incorporates an adversarial term into MT training in order to learn representations that encode as much information about the reference translation as possible while keeping as little information about the input as possible Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation without having to generate pivot translations In addition to being more principled and efficient than round trip MT our approach offers an adjustable parameter to control the fidelity diversity trade off and obtains better results in our experiments', 'ar': 'في أنظمة الاقتراحات الحديثة ، عادة ما تكون هناك تعليقات أو مراجعات من المستخدمين تبرر تصنيفهم لعناصر مختلفة. تتعلم نماذج التوصيات القابلة للتفسير ، التي يتم تدريبها على مثل هذه المجموعة النصية ، اكتشاف اهتمامات المستخدم وإنشاء تفسيرات مخصصة. على الرغم من قدرتها على تقديم تفسيرات معقولة ، تميل النماذج الحالية إلى إنشاء جمل متكررة لعناصر مختلفة أو جمل فارغة مع تفاصيل غير كافية. هذا يطرح سؤالًا مثيرًا للاهتمام: هل يمكننا غمر النماذج في بيئة متعددة الوسائط لاكتساب الوعي المناسب بمفاهيم العالم الحقيقي وتخفيف أوجه القصور المذكورة أعلاه؟ تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقترح نهجا محسنا بصريا يسمى METER بمساعدة إنشاء التصور والتمييز بين النص والصورة: يتم تشجيع نموذج التوصية القابل للتفسير على تصور ما يشير إليه أثناء تكبد عقوبة إذا كان التصور غير متوافق مع شرح نصي. تظهر النتائج التجريبية والتقييم اليدوي أن نهجنا يمكن أن يحسن ليس فقط جودة النص ولكن أيضًا تنوع التفسيرات التي تم إنشاؤها وإمكانية شرحها.', 'fr': "Dans les systèmes de recommandation modernes, il existe généralement des commentaires ou des critiques d'utilisateurs qui justifient leurs évaluations pour différents éléments. Formés sur de tels corpus textuels, les modèles de recommandation explicables apprennent à découvrir les centres d'intérêt des utilisateurs et à générer des explications personnalisées. Bien qu'ils puissent fournir des explications plausibles, les modèles existants ont tendance à générer des phrases répétées pour différents éléments ou des phrases vides avec des détails insuffisants. Cela soulève une question intéressante\xa0: pouvons-nous immerger les modèles dans un environnement multimodal pour prendre conscience des concepts du monde réel et pallier les lacunes ci-dessus\xa0? À cette fin, nous proposons une approche visuellement améliorée nommée METER à l'aide de la génération de visualisation et de la discrimination de correspondance texte-image\xa0: le modèle de recommandation explicable est encouragé à visualiser ce à quoi il fait référence tout en entraçant une pénalité si la visualisation est incongruente avec le texte explication. Les résultats expérimentaux et une évaluation manuelle démontrent que notre approche peut améliorer non seulement la qualité du texte, mais également la diversité et l'explicabilité des explications générées.", 'pt': 'Nos sistemas de recomendação modernos, geralmente há comentários ou avaliações de usuários que justificam suas classificações para diferentes itens. Treinados nesse corpus textual, os modelos de recomendação explicáveis aprendem a descobrir os interesses do usuário e gerar explicações personalizadas. Embora capazes de fornecer explicações plausíveis, os modelos existentes tendem a gerar frases repetidas para itens diferentes ou frases vazias com detalhes insuficientes. Isso levanta uma questão interessante: podemos imergir os modelos em um ambiente multimodal para obter uma conscientização adequada dos conceitos do mundo real e aliviar as deficiências acima? Para este fim, propomos uma abordagem visualmente aprimorada chamada METER com a ajuda da geração de visualização e discriminação de correspondência de texto-imagem: o modelo de recomendação explicável é incentivado a visualizar o que se refere ao incorrer em uma penalidade se a visualização for incongruente com o explicação textual. Resultados experimentais e uma avaliação manual demonstram que nossa abordagem pode melhorar não apenas a qualidade do texto, mas também a diversidade e explicabilidade das explicações geradas.', 'es': 'En los sistemas de recomendación modernos, generalmente hay comentarios o reseñas de los usuarios que justifican sus calificaciones para diferentes artículos. Entrenados en este corpus textual, los modelos de recomendación explicables aprenden a descubrir los intereses de los usuarios y a generar explicaciones personalizadas. Aunque pueden proporcionar explicaciones plausibles, los modelos existentes tienden a generar oraciones repetidas para diferentes elementos o frases vacías con detalles insuficientes. Esto plantea una pregunta interesante: ¿podemos sumergir los modelos en un entorno multimodal para obtener una conciencia adecuada de los conceptos del mundo real y aliviar las deficiencias anteriores? Con este fin, proponemos un enfoque mejorado visualmente llamado METER con la ayuda de la generación de visualización y la discriminación de coincidencia de texto e imagen: se alienta al modelo de recomendación explicable a visualizar a qué se refiere mientras incurre en una penalización si la visualización es incongruente con el texto explicación. Los resultados experimentales y una evaluación manual demuestran que nuestro enfoque puede mejorar no solo la calidad del texto, sino también la diversidad y la explicabilidad de las explicaciones generadas.', 'ja': '最新のレコメンダーシステムでは、通常、ユーザーからのコメントやレビューがあり、さまざまなアイテムに対する評価を正当化します。 このようなテキストコーパスについてトレーニングを受けた説明可能な推奨モデルは、ユーザーの興味を発見し、個別化された説明を生成することを学ぶ。 妥当な説明を提供することはできますが、既存のモデルは、異なる項目の繰り返し文を生成するか、詳細が不十分な空の文を生成する傾向があります。 これには興味深い疑問が投げかけられています。モデルをマルチモーダル環境に浸して、現実世界の概念を適切に認識し、上記の欠点を軽減することはできますか？ そのために、視覚化生成とテキストのマッチングの区別を助けて、メーターという名前の視覚的に強化されたアプローチを提案します。画像マッチングの区別：視覚化がテキストの説明と一致しない場合、説明可能な推奨モデルは、ペナルティが発生している間に参照を視覚化することが推奨されます。 実験結果と手動評価は、私たちのアプローチがテキストの品質だけでなく、生成された説明の多様性と説明可能性を向上させることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '今世荐举统中,常有用户论论以明其异目者评分理也。 于此文本语料库上训练,可解者荐模形学用户见而个性化之说也。 虽能供理解,异目生重句。 此一趣也:吾等能沉浸模样,以得正确认识而减此病乎? 故METER之视强,假可视化以成文本 - 象配以区别:劝可解者可视化其所引,可视化异则罚生。 实验实与手动论,吾法不惟可以崇文质,又可以崇生解之多样性可解释性。', 'hi': 'आधुनिक अनुशंसक प्रणालियों में, आमतौर पर उपयोगकर्ताओं से टिप्पणियां या समीक्षाएं होती हैं जो विभिन्न वस्तुओं के लिए अपनी रेटिंग को सही ठहराती हैं। इस तरह के पाठ्य कॉर्पस पर प्रशिक्षित, समझाने योग्य सिफारिश मॉडल उपयोगकर्ता के हितों की खोज करना और व्यक्तिगत स्पष्टीकरण उत्पन्न करना सीखते हैं। हालांकि प्रशंसनीय स्पष्टीकरण प्रदान करने में सक्षम, मौजूदा मॉडल अपर्याप्त विवरण के साथ विभिन्न वस्तुओं या खाली वाक्यों के लिए दोहराए गए वाक्यों को उत्पन्न करते हैं। यह एक दिलचस्प सवाल पूछता है: क्या हम वास्तविक दुनिया की अवधारणाओं के बारे में उचित जागरूकता हासिल करने और उपरोक्त कमियों को कम करने के लिए एक बहुआयामी वातावरण में मॉडल को विसर्जित कर सकते हैं? इस अंत के लिए, हम विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन पीढ़ी और पाठ की मदद से METER नामक एक नेत्रहीन-संवर्धित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं - छवि मिलान भेदभाव: समझाने योग्य सिफारिश मॉडल को यह देखने के लिए प्रोत्साहित किया जाता है कि यह एक दंड का सामना करते समय क्या संदर्भित करता है यदि विज़ुअलाइज़ेशन पाठ्य स्पष्टीकरण के साथ असंगत है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम और एक मैनुअल मूल्यांकन यह दर्शाता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण न केवल पाठ की गुणवत्ता में सुधार कर सकता है, बल्कि उत्पन्न स्पष्टीकरण की विविधता और व्याख्या में भी सुधार कर सकता है।', 'ru': 'В современных рекомендательных системах обычно есть комментарии или отзывы пользователей, которые оправдывают их рейтинги по разным позициям. Обученные на таком текстовом корпусе, объяснимые рекомендательные модели учатся обнаруживать интересы пользователей и генерировать персонализированные объяснения. Хотя существующие модели способны давать правдоподобные объяснения, они, как правило, генерируют повторяющиеся предложения для разных элементов или пустые предложения с недостаточными деталями. Возникает интересный вопрос: можем ли мы погрузить модели в мультимодальную среду, чтобы получить надлежащее представление о реальных концепциях и устранить недостатки? С этой целью мы предлагаем визуально улучшенный подход с именем МЕТР с помощью визуализации генерации и текста - сопоставление изображений дискриминации: объяснимая рекомендательная модель поощряется к визуализации того, что она ссылается, в то время как подвергается штрафу, если визуализация не согласуется с текстовым объяснением. Экспериментальные результаты и оценка вручную показывают, что наш подход может улучшить не только качество текста, но и разнообразие и объяснимость сгенерированных объяснений.', 'ga': 'I gcórais mholtóra nua-aimseartha, de ghnáth bíonn tuairimí nó léirmheasanna ó úsáideoirí a thugann údar lena rátálacha le haghaidh míreanna éagsúla. Oilte ar chorpas téacsúil den sórt sin, foghlaimíonn múnlaí moltaí inmhínithe conas spéiseanna úsáideoirí a aimsiú agus mínithe pearsanta a ghiniúint. Cé go bhfuil siad in ann mínithe sochreidte a sholáthar, is gnách go ngineann múnlaí atá ann cheana abairtí arís agus arís eile le haghaidh míreanna éagsúla nó abairtí folamh gan dóthain sonraí. Eascraíonn sé seo ceist spéisiúil: an féidir linn na samhlacha a thumadh i dtimpeallacht ilmhódach chun feasacht cheart a fháil ar choincheapa an domhain fhíor agus chun na heasnaimh thuas a mhaolú? Chuige sin, molaimid cur chuige feabhsaithe amhairc darb ainm METER le cabhair ó ghiniúint léirshamhlaithe agus téacs --idirdhealú meaitseála íomhánna: spreagtar an tsamhail mholta inmhínithe chun a bhfuil i gceist leis a shamhlú agus pionós á thabhú mura bhfuil an léirshamhlú ar aon dul leis an míniú téacsach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha agus measúnú láimhe gur féidir lenár gcur chuige feabhas a chur ní amháin ar cháilíocht an téacs ach ar éagsúlacht agus ar inmhínithe na mínithe ginte freisin.', 'hu': 'A modern ajánló rendszerekben általában vannak olyan megjegyzések vagy vélemények a felhasználóktól, amelyek indokolják a különböző elemekre vonatkozó értékeléseiket. Az ilyen szövegkorpuszon képzett magyarázható ajánlási modellek megtanulják felfedezni a felhasználói érdeklődéseket és személyre szabott magyarázatokat generálni. Bár képesek hihető magyarázatokat adni, a meglévő modellek hajlamosak ismétlődő mondatokat generálni különböző tételekhez vagy üres mondatokhoz, nem elegendő részletek nélkül. Ez egy érdekes kérdést vet fel: el tudjuk-e meríteni a modelleket multimodális környezetbe, hogy megfelelő tudatosságot szerezzünk a valós világ koncepcióinak, és enyhítsük a fenti hiányosságokat? Ennek érdekében vizuálisan továbbfejlesztett METER megközelítést javasolunk a vizualizációs generálás és a szöveg-kép megfelelő diszkrimináció segítségével: a megmagyarázható ajánlási modellt arra ösztönözzük, hogy vizualizálja, mire utal, miközben büntetéssel jár, ha a vizualizáció nem megfelel a szöveges magyarázatnak. Kísérleti eredmények és kézi értékelés azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk nem csak a szövegminőséget, hanem a generált magyarázatok sokszínűségét és magyarázhatóságát is javíthatja.', 'el': 'Στα σύγχρονα συστήματα συστάσεων, συνήθως υπάρχουν σχόλια ή κριτικές από χρήστες που δικαιολογούν τις αξιολογήσεις τους για διαφορετικά στοιχεία. Εκπαιδευμένα σε ένα τέτοιο κείμενο, εξηγημένα μοντέλα συστάσεων μαθαίνουν να ανακαλύπτουν τα ενδιαφέροντα των χρηστών και να δημιουργούν εξατομικευμένες εξηγήσεις. Αν και είναι σε θέση να παρέχουν αξιόπιστες εξηγήσεις, τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα τείνουν να παράγουν επαναλαμβανόμενες προτάσεις για διαφορετικά στοιχεία ή κενές προτάσεις με ανεπαρκείς λεπτομέρειες. Αυτό εγείρει ένα ενδιαφέρον ερώτημα: μπορούμε να βυθίσουμε τα μοντέλα σε ένα πολυπροπικό περιβάλλον για να αποκτήσουμε σωστή επίγνωση των πραγματικών εννοιών και να ανακουφίσουμε τις παραπάνω ελλείψεις; Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε μια οπτικά ενισχυμένη προσέγγιση που ονομάζεται ΜΕΤΡΟ με τη βοήθεια της δημιουργίας απεικόνισης και της διάκρισης αντιστοίχισης κειμένου-εικόνας: το εξηγητό μοντέλο σύστασης ενθαρρύνεται να απεικονίσει τι αναφέρεται ενώ υφίσταται ποινή εάν η απεικόνιση είναι ασυμβίβαστη με την επεξήγηση κειμένου. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα και η χειρωνακτική αξιολόγηση καταδεικνύουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να βελτιώσει όχι μόνο την ποιότητα του κειμένου αλλά και την ποικιλομορφία και επεξηγηματικότητα των παραγόμενων επεξηγήσεων.', 'ka': 'მომხმარებელი სისტემებში საერთოდ არსებობს კომენტრებები ან განახლებები, რომლებიც განსხვავებული ელემენტებისთვის მისი რეტინგის განსაზღვრება. ასეთი ტექსუალური კორპუსზე განახსნა, განახსნა მოდელები განახსნა, რომ მომხმარებელი ინტერესტის განახსნა და პორციალური განახსნა შექმნა. მაგრამ შეუძლებელია გახსნა შესაძლებელია, მსოფლიო მოდელები უნდა განახსენება განსხვავებული ელემენტებისთვის განსხვავებული სიტყვებისთვის ან გარეშე სიტყვებისთვი ეს იქნება საინტერესო კითხვა: შეგვიძლია მოდელები მულტიმოდიალური გარემოში გადავიყენოთ, რომ მართლა მსოფლიოს კონფიგურაციების სწორად ცნობიერება და გადავიყენოთ უფრო ეს მიზეზით, ჩვენ ვიზუალურად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მხოლოდ ვიზუალიზაცია და ტექსტის შესაძლებელად მი ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები და მანძილური განსაზღვრება გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა შეუძლია არა მხოლოდ ტექსტის კაalitეტის უფლება, მაგრამ განსაზღვრებული და', 'it': "Nei moderni sistemi di raccomandazione, di solito ci sono commenti o recensioni degli utenti che giustificano le loro valutazioni per elementi diversi. Formati su tale corpus testuale, i modelli di raccomandazione spiegabili imparano a scoprire gli interessi degli utenti e a generare spiegazioni personalizzate. Sebbene in grado di fornire spiegazioni plausibili, i modelli esistenti tendono a generare frasi ripetute per elementi diversi o frasi vuote con dettagli insufficienti. Ciò solleva una domanda interessante: possiamo immergere i modelli in un ambiente multimodale per acquisire una corretta consapevolezza dei concetti del mondo reale e alleviare le carenze sopra riportate? A tal fine, proponiamo un approccio visivamente potenziato denominato METER con l'aiuto della generazione di visualizzazione e discriminazione di matching testo-immagine: il modello di raccomandazione spiegabile è incoraggiato a visualizzare ciò a cui si riferisce incorrendo in una penalità se la visualizzazione è incompatibile con la spiegazione testuale. Risultati sperimentali e una valutazione manuale dimostrano che il nostro approccio può migliorare non solo la qualità del testo, ma anche la diversità e la spiegabilità delle spiegazioni generate.", 'kk': 'Қазіргі рекомендациялау жүйелерінде әдетте басқа нәтижелерді баптау үшін пайдаланушылардың түсініктемелері не түсініктемелері бар. Бұл мәтіндік корпус арқылы оқылған, таңдау үлгілері пайдаланушының қызықтығын табу және жеке түсініктерді жасау үшін оқылған. Мүмкін түсініктемелер келтіруге болады, бірақ барлық үлгілер әртүрлі нысандар не бос сөйлемелер үшін қайталанатын сөйлемелерді жасайды. Бұл қызықты сұрақ береді: біз үлгілерді көптеген ортада қарай аламыз, шын әлемдік концепцияларды дұрыс түсінуге және қажеттіліктерден жоғарылай аламыз ба? Бұл үшін, визуализациялау мен мәтін құру көмегімен METER деп аталатын көмегімен көрініс көмегімен көмектесеміз - кескіні сәйкес келетін дискриминациялау: түсінікті рекомендациялау үлгісі мәтіннің түсініктемесімен қатысты тәртіпке қатысты, есе Эксперименталдық нәтижелер мен қолмен оқиғалар біздің тәсіліміздің тек мәтін сапасын жақсартуға болады, сондай-ақ жасалған түсініктердің әртүрлігін және түсін', 'ms': 'Dalam sistem rekomendasi modern, biasanya terdapat ulasan atau ulasan dari pengguna yang membenarkan nilai mereka untuk item yang berbeza. Latihan pada corpus teks, model rekomendasi yang boleh dijelaskan belajar untuk menemukan kepentingan pengguna dan menghasilkan penjelasan pribadi. Walaupun mampu memberikan penjelasan yang boleh diterima, model yang wujud cenderung menghasilkan kalimat berulang untuk item berbeza atau kalimat kosong dengan perincian yang tidak cukup. Ini mengakibatkan soalan yang menarik: bolehkah kita menyelam model dalam persekitaran multimodal untuk mendapatkan kesadaran yang tepat terhadap konsep dunia nyata dan mengurangi kekurangan di atas? Untuk tujuan ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan meningkat-visual bernama METER dengan bantuan generasi visualisasi dan teks--imej sepadan diskriminasi: model rekomendasi yang boleh dijelaskan dicurahkan untuk visualisasi apa yang ia rujuk kepada semasa mengalami hukuman jika visualisasi tidak sepadan dengan penjelasan teks. Hasil percubaan dan penilaian manual menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita tidak hanya boleh meningkatkan kualiti teks tetapi juga pelbagai dan penjelasan penjelasan yang dijana.', 'lt': 'Šiuolaikinėse rekomendacinėse sistemose paprastai yra vartotojų pastabų ar peržiūrų, kurios pateisina jų reitingus skirtingų straipsnių atžvilgiu. Mokyti tokiu tekstiniu korpusu, paaiškinami rekomendaciniai modeliai mokosi atrasti naudotojų interesus ir sukurti individualius paaiškinimus. Nors gali pateikti patikimus paaiškinimus, esami modeliai dažnai sukuria pakartotinius sakinius skirtingiems straipsniams arba tuščiiems sakiniams, kuriuose nėra pakankamai išsamių duomenų. Tai kelia įdomų klausimą: ar galime panaudoti modelius į daugiarūšio transporto aplinką, kad galėtume tinkamai suprasti tikrojo pasaulio koncepcijas ir pašalinti trūkumus? Šiuo tikslu siūlome vizualizuotą požiūrį, pavadintą METER, padedant vizualizuoti kūrimą ir tekstą - vaizdą atitinkančią diskriminaciją: paaiškinamas rekomendacinis model is skatinamas vizualizuoti tai, ką jis reiškia, kartu skiriant baudą, jei vizualizavimas neatitinka tekstinio paaiškinimo. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai ir rankinis vertinimas rodo, kad mūsų požiūris gali pagerinti ne tik teksto kokybę, bet ir sukauptų paaiškinimų įvairovę ir paaiškinimų paaiškinimą.', 'mk': 'Во модерните препорачачки системи, обично постојат коментари или рецензии од корисниците кои ги оправдуваат нивните оценки за различни предмети. Тренирани на такви текстуални корпуси, објаснливи препорачани модели научија да откриваат интереси на корисниците и да генерираат персонализирани објаснувања. Иако можат да објаснат веројатни објаснувања, постојните модели имаат тенденција да генерираат повторни реченици за различни предмети или празни реченици со недоволни детали. Ова предизвикува интересно прашање: дали можеме да ги вложиме моделите во мултимодилна средина за да добиеме соодветна свест за концептите на реалниот свет и да ги олесниме над недостатоците? За оваа цел, предложуваме визуелно подобрен пристап наречен METER со помош на генерацијата на визуелизација и текстот - слика одговара на дискриминација: објаснувачкиот модел на препорака се охрабрува да го визуелизира она на што се однесува додека се наоѓа казна ако визуелизацијата не е во согласност со текстовото објаснување. Експерименталните резултати и рачната проценка покажуваат дека нашиот пристап може да го подобри не само квалитетот на текстот, туку и различноста и објаснливоста на генерираните објаснувања.', 'mt': 'In modern recommender systems, there are usually comments or reviews from users that justify their ratings for different items.  Taħriġ fuq korpus testwali bħal dan, mudelli ta’ rakkomandazzjoni spjegabbli jitgħallmu jiskopru l-interessi tal-utent u jiġġeneraw spjegazzjonijiet personalizzati. Għalkemm jistgħu jipprovdu spjegazzjonijiet plawżibbli, mudelli eżistenti għandhom it-tendenza li jiġġeneraw sentenzi ripetuti għal oġġetti differenti jew sentenzi vojta b’dettalji insuffiċjenti. This begs an interesting question: can we immerse the models in a multimodal environment to gain proper awareness of real-world concepts and alleviate above shortcomings?  Għal dan il-għan, qed nipproponu approċċ imsejjaħ METER b’mod viżwali bl-għajnuna tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-viżwalizzazzjoni u t-test - diskriminazzjoni li tikkorrispondi l-immaġni: il-mudell ta’ rakkomandazzjoni li jista’ jiġi spjegat huwa mħeġġeġ biex jiġi viżwalizzat dak li jirreferi għalih waqt li tinħoloq penali jekk il-viżwalizzazzjoni tkun inkonsistenti mal-ispjegazzjoni testwali. Riżultati esperimentali u valutazzjoni manwali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jista’ jtejjeb mhux biss il-kwalità tat-test iżda wkoll id-diversità u l-ispjegabbiltà tal-ispjegazzjonijiet iġġenerati.', 'mn': 'Орчин үеийн зөвлөх зөвлөмжүүдийн системд хэрэглэгчид өөр зүйлсийг тодорхойлж чаддаг захирал эсвэл шалгалт байдаг. Хэрэглэгчийн сонирхолтой олж, хувийн тайлбар үүсгэнэ. Гэхдээ итгэлтэй тодорхойлолт өгөх боломжтой ч, суурилсан загварууд өөр зүйлс эсвэл хоосон өгүүлбэрүүдийг хангалттай нарийвчлалтай давтах үг бий болгодог. Энэ нь сонирхолтой асуулт гарч ирнэ: бид бодит ертөнцийн ойлголтыг зөв ойлгохын тулд олон загварын орчинд загваруудыг хадгалж болох уу? Үүний тулд бид METER гэдэг ойлголтын тусламжтай харагдах болон текстэй тусламжтай, харагдах тусламжтай арга загварыг санал болгож байна: тайлбарлах зөвлөлтийн загвар нь юу гэсэн үг вэ гэдгийг харуулах боломжтой. Хэрвээ харагдах нь текстэй тодорхойлолтоор буруу байвал шалтгаан ав Эмчилгээний үр дүнг болон гарын шалгалт нь бидний арга баримтууд зөвхөн текст чанарыг сайжруулж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн үүсгэсэн тодорхойлолтын олон янз бүрийн болон тайлбарлах боломж', 'ml': 'ആധുനിക ശുപാര്\u200dശിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d, സാധാരണയായി വ്യത്യസ്ത വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നീതിപ്പെടുത് ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ പേരില്\u200d പരിശീലനം നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, ഉപയോക്താവിന്\u200dറെ താല്പര്യങ്ങള്\u200d  വ്യത്യസ്ത വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കോ വെറുതെ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കോ കാലിയായ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കോ നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന വാക് ഇതൊരു രസകരമായ ചോദ്യം ആരംഭിക്കുന്നു: നമുക്ക് ഒരു മൊഡലുകള്\u200d മാറ്റാന്\u200d കഴിയുമോ? യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ ആശയങ്ങളെ ശരിക്കും മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d  ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി, മെട്ര്\u200d എന്ന പേരില്\u200d മെട്ടെര്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഒരു കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പ്രായോഗ്രാം പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. ചിത്രം വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സഹായത്തോ Experimental results and a manual assessment demonstrate that our approach can improve not only the text quality but also the diversity and explainability of the generated explanations.', 'no': 'I moderne anbefalingssystemet er det vanlegvis kommentarar eller gjennomsikt frå brukarar som justerer verdiane for ulike element. Treng på slike tekstkorpus, forklarbare anbefalingsmodeller lærer å oppdaga brukarinteressar og laga personlege forklaringar. Selv om det kan gjere tilgjengelege forklaringar, er det vanlege å laga gjentaande setningar for ulike element eller tomme setningar med ukjente detaljar. Dette begynner eit interessant spørsmål: Kan vi avslutta modellen i eit multimodal miljø for å få riktig forståelse av verdens konseptar og alleviare over feilkorgane? I denne måten foreslår vi eit visuelt forbetra tilnærming med namnet METER med hjelp til visualisering og tekst - biletet som passar med diskriminasjon: den forklarbare anbefalingsmodellen blir oppretta til å visualisere kva han refererer til mens det gjer ein straum dersom det er ikkje samsvar med tekstutklaringa. Eksperimentale resultat og ei manuelvurdering viser at tilnærminga vårt kan forbetra ikkje bare tekstkvaliteten, men også mangfolden og forklaringa av dei genererte forklaringane.', 'pl': 'W nowoczesnych systemach rekomenderów zazwyczaj pojawiają się komentarze lub recenzje od użytkowników, które uzasadniają ich oceny dla różnych pozycji. Przeszkolone na takim korpusie tekstowym modele rekomendacji uczą się odkrywać zainteresowania użytkowników i generować spersonalizowane wyjaśnienia. Choć istniejące modele są w stanie dostarczyć wiarygodnych wyjaśnień, generują powtarzające się zdania dla różnych elementów lub puste zdania z niewystarczającymi szczegółami. To rodzi ciekawe pytanie: czy możemy zanurzyć modele w środowisku multimodalnym, aby uzyskać odpowiednią świadomość koncepcji świata rzeczywistego i złagodzić powyższe niedociągnięcia? W tym celu proponujemy podejście wzmocnione wizualnie o nazwie METER z pomocą generowania wizualizacji i dyskryminacji dopasowania tekstu – obrazu: wyjaśniony model rekomendacji jest zachęcany do wizualizacji tego, do czego odnosi się podczas ponoszenia kary, jeśli wizualizacja jest niezgodna z wyjaśnieniem tekstowym. Wyniki eksperymentalne i ocena ręczna pokazują, że nasze podejście może poprawić nie tylko jakość tekstu, ale także różnorodność i wyjaśnialność generowanych wyjaśnień.', 'ro': 'În sistemele moderne de recomandare, există, de obicei, comentarii sau recenzii de la utilizatori care justifică evaluările lor pentru diferite elemente. Instruite pe un astfel de corpus textual, modelele de recomandare explicabile învață să descopere interesele utilizatorilor și să genereze explicații personalizate. Deși sunt capabile să ofere explicații plauzibile, modelele existente tind să genereze propoziții repetate pentru diferite elemente sau propoziții goale cu detalii insuficiente. Acest lucru ridică o întrebare interesantă: putem scufunda modelele într-un mediu multimodal pentru a obține conștientizarea adecvată a conceptelor din lumea reală și pentru a atenua deficiențele de mai sus? În acest scop, propunem o abordare vizuală îmbunătățită numită METER cu ajutorul discriminării de generare a vizualizării și potrivire text-imagine: modelul de recomandare explicabil este încurajat să vizualizeze ceea ce se referă în timp ce suportă o penalizare în cazul în care vizualizarea este incompatibilă cu explicația textuală. Rezultatele experimentale și o evaluare manuală demonstrează că abordarea noastră poate îmbunătăți nu numai calitatea textului, ci și diversitatea și explicabilitatea explicabilității explicațiilor generate.', 'sr': 'U modernim sistemima preporučujući, obično postoje komentari ili pregledi korisnika koji opravdavaju njihove ocjene za različite predmete. Trenirani na takvom tekstualnom korpusu, objašnjavajućim modelima preporuke naučili su otkriti interese korisnika i stvarati lične objašnjenje. Iako je moguće da pruži uvjerljive objašnjenje, postojeći modeli obično stvaraju ponovne rečenice za različite predmete ili prazne rečenice sa nedovoljnim detaljima. Ovo postavlja zanimljivo pitanje: možemo li da uklonimo modele u multimodalno okruženje da bi dobili odgovarajuću svijest koncepta stvarnog svijeta i olakšali iznad nedostataka? Za taj cilj predlažemo vizualno poboljšan pristup po imenu METER sa pomoć generacije vizualizacije i teksta - slika koja odgovara diskriminaciji: model preporuke koji se objašnjava ohrabruje da vizualizira ono na šta se odnosi dok se suočava sa kaznom ako vizualizacija ne odgovara tekstualnom objašnjenju. Eksperimentalni rezultati i ručna procena pokazuju da naš pristup može poboljšati ne samo kvalitet teksta, već i raznolikost i objašnjavanje proizvedenih objašnjenja.', 'so': "Sida caadiga ah waxaa isticmaalayaasha ka hela qiimeyn ama baaritaan, kuwaas oo xaq u dhiga qiimahooda alaabta kala duduwan. Waxbarashada ku qoran qoraalkaas, noocyada hagitaanka oo aan faa’iideyn karin waxay bartaan in ay ogaadaan danaha isticmaalaha iyo uu soo saaro fasaxyo gaar ah. In kastoo uu awoodi karo in uu fasax faa'iido ah siiyo, modellada joogta waxaa inta badan ka soo bixinaya ciqaab lagu soo celiyo alaab kala duduwan ama erayo madhan ah oo aan ku filnayn wax faa'iido ah. Tani waxay bilowdaa su'aalo xiiso leh: ma sameyn karnaa noocyada deegaanka kala duduwan si a an u helno garashada saxda fikrada dunida oo dhabta ah oo aan uga fududeyn karno dhamaanka? To this end, we propose a visually-enhanced approach named METER with the help of visualization generation and text--image matching discrimination: the explainable recommendation model is encouraged to visualize what it refers to while incurring a penalty if the visualization is incongruent with the textual explanation.  Mataarada imtixaanka iyo kaartaynta gacanta ah waxay muujiyaan in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu kordhin karo qiimaha qoraalka oo kaliya laakiin sidoo kale kala duduwan iyo faa'iidada fasaxa dhalay.", 'sv': 'I moderna rekommenderade system finns det vanligtvis kommentarer eller recensioner från användare som motiverar deras betyg för olika objekt. Utbildade på sådan textkorpus lär sig förklaringsmodeller att upptäcka användarintressen och generera personliga förklaringar. Även om de kan ge rimliga förklaringar tenderar befintliga modeller att generera upprepade meningar för olika objekt eller tomma meningar med otillräckliga detaljer. Detta väcker en intressant fråga: kan vi fördjupa modellerna i en multimodal miljö för att få ordentlig medvetenhet om verkliga koncept och lindra ovanstående brister? För detta ändamål föreslår vi ett visuellt förbättrat tillvägagångssätt som heter METER med hjälp av visualiseringsgenerering och text--image matchning diskriminering: den förklaringsbara rekommendationsmodellen uppmuntras att visualisera vad den hänvisar till samtidigt ådra sig straff om visualiseringen är oförenlig med textförklaringen. Experimentella resultat och en manuell bedömning visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt inte bara kan förbättra textkvaliteten utan också mångfalden och förklaringsförmågan hos de genererade förklaringarna.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய பரிந்துரைப்பாட்டு அமைப்புகளில், வழக்கமாக வித்தியாசமான உருப்படிகளுக்கான விகிதத்தை நிர்ணயிக்கும்  இவ்வாறு நிரல் கார்ப்ஸ் மீது பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டது, விளக்கமான பரிந்துரைப்பு மாதிரிகள் பயனர் வட்டிகளை கண்டுபிடிக் இயல்பான விளக்கங்களை வழங்க முடியுமாயினும், இருக்கும் மாதிரிகள் வேறு விளக்கங்களுடன் தேவையான விவரங்களுடன் திரும்பச் செ This begs an interesting question: can we immerse the models in a multimodal environment to gain proper awareness of real-world concepts and alleviate above shortcomings?  இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் பார்வை உருவாக்குதல் மற்றும் உரையை பொருத்தும் உரையின் உதவியால் METER பெயர் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒரு பார்வையை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் - பிம்பம் விளக்கம் பொருந்தும்: விள முயற்சி முடிவுகள் மற்றும் கைமுறை மதிப்பீடு காண்பிக்கிறது நமது வழிமுறையை உரை தரம் மட்டும் மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை மட்டும்', 'si': 'අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පද්ධතියෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හෝ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ඔවුන්ගේ  අනිවාර්ය පාළුවන් කොර්පස් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට හැබැයි විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර දෙන්න, තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ මොඩේල් වලින් වෙනස් අයිති අයිති විස්තර සඳහා ආප මේක විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් මෝඩේල් එක්ක ගොඩක් මෝඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළ මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මෙටෙර් නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ පාළුවන් උදව් සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් - ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ පුද්ගලික පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ව', 'ur': 'آغاز ترجیح دینے والے سیسٹموں میں، معمولاً کارساز کے ٹوکیٹ یا ریونٹ ہیں جو مختلف اتمام کے لئے ان کے ریینٹوں کو ثابت کر رہے ہیں. اس طرح کی تدریس کورپوس پر تعلیم کی جاتی ہے، سفارشی قابل توصیح کی موڈل یاد رکھتے ہیں کہ کارساز کے علاقے پیدا کریں اور شخصی توضیح پیدا کریں۔ Though able to provide plausible explanations, existing models tend to generate repeated sentences for different items or empty sentences with insufficient details. یہ ایک دلچسپ سوال ہے: کیا ہم مدلکوں کو ایک بہت سی موڈال محیط میں نابود کر سکتے ہیں کہ حقیقی دنیا کی نظریں کو اچھی خبر حاصل کریں اور ناکاموں سے زیادہ کم کریں؟ اس کے لئے ہم ایک نظر سے زیادہ مہربانی طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کریں گے جس کا نام METER ہے کہ visualization generation اور text کی مدد کے ساتھ -تصویر کے مطابق تفریق کے مطابق مطابق ہے: سفارشی قابل توصیح موڈل کو دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ اس کے ذریعہ کس چیز کا ذریعہ دکھائے جاتی ہے اور اگر تصویز کی توصیح کے مطابق آزمائش کے نتائج اور ایک ہاتھی آزمائش کی تصویر دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ صرف پیغام کی کیفیت کو بہتر کر سکتی ہے بلکہ پیدا کئے ہوئے توضیح کی مختلف اور توضیح کا بھی بہتر کر سکتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu ma'lum matn corpusda o'rganilgan so'zlar modellari foydalanuvchi qiziqlarni topish va shaxsiy fashqaruvni yaratish uchun o'rganadi. Though able to provide plausible explanations, existing models tend to generate repeated sentences for different items or empty sentences with insufficient details.  Bu juda qiziqarli savol boshlanadi: biz mulododalar muhimda modellarni ajratib, dunyodagi g'oyalarning haqiqiqiy tushunishni o'rganish va kichkina narsalarni yoqishni istaysizmi? Shunday qilib, biz ETER nomli qo'shimcha usulni tasavvur qilish va matn- rasm yordamida qo'shimcha qo'llab-qo'yish bilan qo'yish qo'llaniladi. Boshqaruv modeli, bu soʻzni o'zgartirish mumkin, agar ko'rinishi matnni faqat emas bo'lsa, ma'lumotni o'rganish mumkin. Tekshirish natijalari va qoʻlbola qiymatlarimiz shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning usuli faqat matn sifatida o'zgartira oladi, balki yaratilgan faqat ma'lumotlarning turli va faqat fikrlarini oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong các hệ thống liên minh hiện đại, thường có những bình luận hoặc đánh giá của người dùng cho những mục khác nhau. Huấn luyện trên cơ thể đó, các mô hình khuyến cáo có thể giải thích được học cách khám phá lợi ích của người dùng và cung cấp giải thích riêng. Mặc dù có khả năng giải thích hợp lý, các mô hình hiện tại thường tạo ra câu trả lời lặp lại cho các mục khác nhau hoặc câu bỏ trống với thiếu chi tiết. Điều này đặt ra một câu hỏi thú vị: chúng ta có thể bỏ các mô hình trong môi trường đa phương để đạt được ý thức thích đáng về các khái niệm thế giới thực và giảm thiểu? Vì vậy, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp nâng cao hình ảnh tên METER với sự giúp đỡ của sản xuất và văn bản phân biệt hình ảnh tương ứng: mô hình khuyến cáo có thể xác định được những gì nó liên quan trong khi bị phạt nếu sự hình dung không khớp với các giải thích cấu hình. Kết quả thí nghiệm và một đánh giá bằng tay cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể cải thiện không chỉ chất lượng văn bản, mà còn sự khác biệt và rõ ràng của những giải thích được tạo ra.', 'bg': 'В съвременните системи за препоръки обикновено има коментари или отзиви от потребители, които оправдават оценките си за различни елементи. Обучени върху такъв текстов корпус, обясними модели препоръки се научават да откриват интересите на потребителите и да генерират персонализирани обяснения. Въпреки че могат да предоставят правдоподобни обяснения, съществуващите модели са склонни да генерират повтарящи се изречения за различни елементи или празни изречения с недостатъчни подробности. Това поражда интересен въпрос: можем ли да потопим моделите в мултимодална среда, за да придобием правилна осведоменост за концепциите от реалния свят и да облекчим тези недостатъци? За тази цел предлагаме визуално подобрен подход, наречен МЕТЪР, с помощта на генериране на визуализация и дискриминация за съвпадение на текст-изображения: обяснимият модел на препоръка се насърчава да визуализира това, за което се отнася, като същевременно се налага наказание, ако визуализацията е несъвместима с текстовото обяснение. Експерименталните резултати и ръчната оценка показват, че нашият подход може да подобри не само качеството на текста, но и разнообразието и обяснимостта на генерираните обяснения.', 'da': 'I moderne anbefalingssystemer er der normalt kommentarer eller anmeldelser fra brugere, der retfærdiggør deres vurderinger for forskellige elementer. Uddannet i et sådant tekstkorpus lærer forklarelige anbefalingsmodeller at opdage brugerinteresser og generere personlige forklaringer. Selvom de er i stand til at give sandsynlige forklaringer, har eksisterende modeller tendens til at generere gentagne sætninger for forskellige elementer eller tomme sætninger med utilstrækkelige detaljer. Dette rejser et interessant spørgsmål: Kan vi fordybe modellerne i et multimodalt miljø for at opnå ordentlig bevidsthed om virkelighedens koncepter og afhjælpe ovennævnte mangler? Til dette formål foreslår vi en visuelt forbedret tilgang kaldet METER ved hjælp af visualiseringsgenerering og tekst--billedmatching diskrimination: Den forklarelige anbefalingsmodel opfordres til at visualisere, hvad den refererer til, samtidig med at det pådrages en straf, hvis visualiseringen er i strid med tekstforklaringen. Eksperimentelle resultater og en manuel vurdering viser, at vores tilgang ikke kun kan forbedre tekstkvaliteten, men også mangfoldigheden og forklareligheden af de genererede forklaringer.', 'hr': 'U modernim sustavima preporukivača obično postoje komentari ili pregledi korisnika koji opravdavaju njihove ocjene za različite predmete. Trenirani na takvom tekstualnom korpusu, objašnjivi modeli preporuke naučili su otkriti interese korisnika i proizvesti osobne objašnjenje. Iako je moguće pružiti uvjerljive objašnjenje, postojeći modeli obično stvaraju ponavljane rečenice za različite predmete ili prazne rečenice sa nedovoljnim detaljima. To postavlja zanimljivo pitanje: možemo li zamijeniti modele u multimodalnom okruženju kako bi dobili odgovarajuću svijest koncept stvarnog svijeta i olakšali iznad nedostataka? Za taj cilj predlažemo vizualno poboljšan pristup po imenu MEMETER s pomoći generacije vizualizacije i teksta - diskriminacije koja odgovara slikama: model preporuke koji se objašnjava ohrabruje da vizualizira ono na što se odnosi dok se suočava sa kaznom ako vizualizacija nije u skladu s tekstualnim objašnjenjem. Eksperimentalni rezultati i ručna procjena pokazuju da naš pristup može poboljšati ne samo kvalitet teksta, već i raznolikost i objašnjenje proizvedenih objašnjenja.', 'id': 'Dalam sistem rekomendasi modern, biasanya ada komentar atau ulasan dari pengguna yang membenarkan nilai mereka untuk item yang berbeda. Latihan pada corpus teks seperti itu, model rekomendasi yang bisa dijelaskan belajar untuk menemukan kepentingan pengguna dan menghasilkan penjelasan pribadi. Meskipun mampu memberikan penjelasan yang plausible, model yang ada cenderung untuk menghasilkan kalimat berulang untuk item berbeda atau kalimat kosong dengan rincian yang tidak cukup. Ini membuat pertanyaan yang menarik: bisakah kita menyelam model-model dalam lingkungan multimodal untuk mendapatkan kesadaran yang tepat tentang konsep dunia nyata dan mengurangi kekurangan di atas? Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan meningkatkan visual bernama METER dengan bantuan generasi visualisasi dan teks--gambar yang cocok diskriminasi: model rekomendasi yang dapat dijelaskan disemangat untuk membayangkan apa yang direferensikan saat mengalami hukuman jika visualisasi tidak cocok dengan penjelasan teks. Experimental results and a manual assessment demonstrate that our approach can improve not only the text quality but also the diversity and explainability of the generated explanations.', 'de': 'In modernen Empfehlungssystemen gibt es in der Regel Kommentare oder Bewertungen von Nutzern, die ihre Bewertungen für verschiedene Artikel rechtfertigen. Erklärbare Empfehlungsmodelle lernen, Nutzerinteressen zu entdecken und personalisierte Erklärungen zu generieren. Obwohl sie plausible Erklärungen liefern können, neigen existierende Modelle dazu, wiederholte Sätze für verschiedene Elemente oder leere Sätze mit unzureichenden Details zu generieren. Dies wirft eine interessante Frage auf: Können wir die Modelle in eine multimodale Umgebung eintauchen, um ein angemessenes Bewusstsein für reale Konzepte zu erlangen und oben genannte Mängel zu beseitigen? Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir einen visuell verbesserten Ansatz namens METER mit Hilfe von Visualisierungsgenerierung und Text-Bild-Matching Diskriminierung vor: Das erklärbare Empfehlungsmodell wird ermutigt, zu visualisieren, worauf es sich bezieht, während eine Strafe entsteht, wenn die Visualisierung nicht mit der textuellen Erklärung übereinstimmt. Experimentelle Ergebnisse und eine manuelle Bewertung zeigen, dass unser Ansatz nicht nur die Textqualität, sondern auch die Vielfalt und Erklärbarkeit der generierten Erklärungen verbessern kann.', 'fa': 'در سیستم\u200cهای پیشنهاد مدرن، معمولاً توضیح\u200cها یا بررسی\u200cها از کاربران وجود دارند که مقدار\u200cهایشان را برای عناصر مختلف تصدیق می\u200cکنند. آموزش داده شده بر این قالب متن، مدلهای پیشنهاد قابل توضیح یاد می گیرند که علاقه های کاربر را کشف کنند و توضیح شخصی را تولید کنند. اگرچه قادر به توضیح قابل توضیح\u200cهای قابل توضیح دادن باشد، مدل\u200cهای موجود به تولید جمله\u200cهای تکرار برای عناصر مختلف یا جمله\u200cهای خالی با جزئیات کافی تولید می\u200cکنند. این سوال جالبی را می\u200cخواهد: آیا می\u200cتوانیم مدل\u200cها را در محیط زیست\u200cهای متعدد نابود کنیم تا آگاهی مناسب از نظریه\u200cهای دنیای واقعی را دریافت کنیم و از کمبود\u200cها کمتر کنیم؟ برای این قسمت، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش به نظر بینایی به نام METER با کمک نسل و متن تصویر - تصویر با جدایی مشابه دارد: مدل توضیح قابل توضیح برای تصویر کردن چیزی که به آن ارائه می\u200cدهد، در حالی که مجازات می\u200cشود اگر تصویر با توضیح متن مخالف نیست. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه و ارزیابی دستی نشان می\u200cدهند که دسترسی ما نمی\u200cتواند فقط کیفیت متن را بهتر کند، بلکه همچنین گوناگونی و توضیح\u200cهای توضیح\u200cهای تولید شده را بهتر کند.', 'sw': 'Katika mifumo ya mapendekezo ya kisasa, mara nyingi kuna maoni au maoni kutoka kwa watumiaji ambao huhalalisha rasmi zao kwa vitu tofauti. Walijifunza kwenye makampuni haya ya msingi, mifano ya mapendekezo yasiyoeleweka wanajifunza kugundua maslahi ya watumiaji na kutengeneza maelezo ya kibinafsi. Pamoja na kuwa na uwezo wa kutoa maelezo yasiyo sahihi, mifano ya sasa huenda kutengeneza hukumu za mara kwa mara kwa ajili ya vitu tofauti au hukumu potofu yenye maelezo yasiyosha. This begs an interesting question: can we immerse the models in a multimodal environment to gain proper awareness of real-world concepts and alleviate above shortcomings?  Kwa mwisho huu, tunapendekeza mbinu ya kuongezeka inayoitwa METER kwa msaada wa kizazi cha kuonyesha na kuandika - picha inayolinganisha na ubaguzi: mtindo wa pendekezo lisiloeleweka unahamasishwa kuonyesha kile kinachomaanisha wakati wa kutengeneza adhabu kama kuonekana havina maana ya msingi. Matokeo ya majaribio na tathmini ya mkono yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inaweza kuboresha si tu ubora wa maandishi bali pia utofauti na ufafanuzi wa maelezo yaliyozaliwa.', 'ko': '현대 추천 시스템에서는 일반적으로 사용자의 평론이나 평론이 서로 다른 항목에 대한 평점이 합리적이라는 것을 증명한다.이러한 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련 가능한 추천 모델 학습은 사용자의 흥미를 발견하고 개성화된 해석을 생성한다.기존 모델은 합리적인 해석을 제공할 수 있지만 서로 다른 항목에 중복된 문장을 생성하거나 디테일이 부족한 빈 문장을 생성하는 경우가 많다.이것은 흥미로운 문제를 불러일으켰다. 우리는 모델을 다중모드적 환경에 몰입시켜 현실 세계 개념에 대한 정확한 인식을 얻고 상술한 단점을 완화시킬 수 있을까?이를 위해 우리는 시각화 생성과 텍스트-이미지 일치 식별의 도움말 아래 METER라는 시각적 강화 방법을 제시했다. 해석 가능한 추천 모델이 가리키는 내용을 시각화하도록 격려하고 시각화와 텍스트 해석이 일치하지 않으면 처벌을 받는다.실험 결과와 수동 평가에 따르면 우리의 방법은 텍스트의 질을 높일 뿐만 아니라 생성 해석의 다양성과 해석성을 높일 수 있다.', 'nl': 'In moderne aanbevelingssystemen zijn er meestal opmerkingen of beoordelingen van gebruikers die hun beoordelingen voor verschillende items rechtvaardigen. Opgeleid op een dergelijk tekstueel corpus leren uitlegbare aanbevelingsmodellen gebruikersinteresses te ontdekken en gepersonaliseerde verklaringen te genereren. Hoewel bestaande modellen plausibele verklaringen kunnen geven, genereren ze vaak herhaalde zinnen voor verschillende items of lege zinnen met onvoldoende details. Dit roept een interessante vraag op: kunnen we de modellen onderdompelen in een multimodale omgeving om een goed bewustzijn te krijgen van echte concepten en bovengenoemde tekortkomingen te verlichten? Hiertoe stellen we een visueel verbeterde aanpak voor met de naam METER met behulp van visualisatie generatie en tekst-beeld matching discriminatie: het uitlegbare aanbevelingsmodel wordt aangemoedigd om te visualiseren waar het naar verwijst terwijl het een boete oploopt als de visualisatie incongruent met de tekstuele uitleg. Experimentele resultaten en een handmatige evaluatie tonen aan dat onze aanpak niet alleen de tekstkwaliteit, maar ook de diversiteit en uitlegbaarheid van de gegenereerde verklaringen kan verbeteren.', 'af': "In moderne aanbevelingsstelsels is daar gewoonlik kommentaar of hersienings van gebruikers wat hulle reetings regverdig vir verskillende items. Onderleer op sodanige tekstuele korpus, verduidelik aanbevelingsmodele leer om gebruikerinteresse te ontdek en persoonlike uitduidelings te genereer. Alhoewel in staat om plaasbaar uitduidelings te verskaf, bestaande modele tendeer na genereer herhaalde setnings vir verskillende items of leë setnings met onvoldoende details. Hierdie vra 'n interessante vraag: kan ons die modele in 'n multimodaal omgewing uitvee om regte bekend te kry van regte wêreld konsepte en onder kortpaaklikhede te verminder? Na hierdie einde, voorstel ons 'n visuele-verbeterde toegang genaamd METER met die hulp van visualisering generasie en teks - beeld ooreenstemmende diskriminasie: die verduidelike aanbevelingsmodel is aanbevestig om te visualiseer wat dit verwys terwyl dit 'n straf voorkom as die visualisering nie ooreenstem is met die teks-uitduideling. Eksperimentale resultate en 'n handoorsaak bevestig dat ons toegang kan nie net die teks kwaliteit verbeter nie, maar ook die verskildigheid en verduidelikheid van die genereerde uitduidelings.", 'tr': 'Modern maslahat töwekgelçi sistemalarda adatça ullançylaryň döwürmelerini beýleki elementler üçin dogrylaşdyrýan terjimeler ýa-da wersiýalar bar. Şol ýaly tekst korpusynda bilinmedili, düşündirýän maslahatlar nusgalary ullanýarlar we şahsy düşündirimleri döreýärler. Aýan düşündirilebilir düşündirip bilýän bolsa-da, bar modeller farklı zatlar üçin ýene-täsirli sözleri döretýär ýa-da boş sözler ýene-de ýeterlik detaylar bilen döretýär. Bu gyzykly sorag başlaýar: biz multimodal ortamda modelleri düzgün dünýä düşünjelerini ýetirmek üçin düzgün bilinç almak we ýeterlik etmek üçin nusgalaryny azaltyp bileris? Bu yüzden, görselleştirme ve metin şeklinde eşleşen bir şekilde METER adlı bir yaklaşma teklif ediyoruz. Araşdyrylyk netijeleri we el çözümlenmesi biziň golaýymyzyň diňe metin howpsalatyny gowurap biljek däl, ýöne üretilen düşündirimleriň näçe-görnüşliklerini we düşündirilebiligini görkezip bilýär.', 'sq': "Në sistemet moderne rekomanduese, zakonisht ka komente apo përmbledhje nga përdoruesit që justifikojnë vlerësimet e tyre për objekte të ndryshme. Trenuar në një korpus të tillë tekstual, modele të shpjeguara rekomandimi mësojnë të zbulojnë interesat e përdoruesve dhe të gjenerojnë shpjegime personalizuara. Megjithëse në gjendje të ofrojnë shpjegime të besueshme, modelet ekzistuese tenderojnë të gjenerojnë fjalime të përsëritura për objekte të ndryshme apo fjalime bosh me detaje të pamjaftueshme. Kjo sjell një pyetje interesante: a mund t'i përmbytim modelet në një mjedis multimodal për të fituar ndërgjegjësimin e duhur për konceptet e botës reale dhe për të lehtësuar mbi mungesat? Për këtë qëllim, ne propozojmë një qasje të përmirësuar vizualisht të quajtur METER me ndihmën e gjeneratës së vizualizimit dhe tekstit -- imazhi që përshtatet diskriminimit: modeli i shpjegueshëm rekomandimi është inkurajuar për të vizualizuar atë që referohet ndërsa merret me një dënim në qoftë se vizualizimi nuk është në përputhje me shpjegimin tekstual. Rezultatet eksperimentale dhe një vlerësim manual demonstrojnë se qasja jonë mund të përmirësojë jo vetëm cilësinë e tekstit, por gjithashtu diversitetin dhe shpjeguesinë e shpjegimeve të gjeneruara.", 'am': 'በአዲስ ወቅት ጉዳይ ስርዓቶች፣ በተለያዩ ዕቃዎች ላይ ክፍላቸውን የሚያስተካክሉ ከተጠቃሚዎች አስተያየት ወይም አስተያየት አሉ፡፡ እንደዚህ በጽሑፍ ኮፕስ ላይ ተማርቷል፣ የሚገልጹ ማስታወቂያ ሞዴላዎች የተጠቃሚዎችን ፍቃድ ለማግኘት እና የራሳቸውን ፍቺኮች ለማፍጠር ይማራሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የሚችል ትርጓሜዎችን ማግኘት ቢችል፣ የአሁኑ ሞዴል ለሌላ አካላት ወይም ለባዶ ቃላት በኩል ዝርዝሮች መፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ ይህ የሚጠያየቅ ጥያቄ ይጀምራል፤ በብዙ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ውስጥ ያሉትን ምሳሌዎች እውነተኛውን ዓለም አሳውቀትን ለማግኘት እና በጉዳዩ ላይ ማስታወቂያውን እና ማቅረብ ይችላልን? To this end, we propose a visually-enhanced approach named METER with the help of visualization generation and text--image matching discrimination: the explainable recommendation model is encouraged to visualize what it refers to while incurring a penalty if the visualization is incongruent with the textual explanation.  ፈተና ውጤቶች እና በጃንደረባ አካሄዱ የጽሑፉን ብዛት ብቻ እንዲያበዛ እና የተፈጠረውን ትርጉም እና ማስታወቂያውን እንዲያበጅል ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Şimdiki təsirli sistemlərdə, müxtəlif məsələlər üçün dəyişikliklərini təsdiqləyən istifadəçilərin şəkilləri və təsirləri var. Bu textual korpus üzərində təhsil edilmişdir, müfəssəl tövsiyə modelləri istifadəçilərin intereslərini keşfetməsini öyrənmişdir və kişisel təfsilatları yaratmağı öyrənmişdir. Əlbəttə, mövcud modellər fərqli məsələlər və boş cümlələr üçün təkrarlanan cümlələr təkrarlanmayaraq və kifayət detaylarla təkrarlanmayaraq təkrarlanır. Bu ilginç bir sual tələb edir: çoxlu modal ortamda modelləri düzgün dünyanın fikirlərini öyrənmək və zəiflərdən üstün azaltmaq üçün müəyyən edə bilərik? Bu səbəbdə, vizualizasyon nəsillərinin və mətnlərin köməyi ilə METER adlı vizualizasyon tərzini təbliğ edirik - görüntü müqayisədə istifadə edir: a çıq-aydın təbliğ modeli, əgər vizualizasyon textual açıqlaması ilə müqayisədə olmasa, onun nəyə danışdığını görünmək üçün təşkil edilir. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçları və əlavə təcrübə göstərir ki, bizim təcrübəmiz yalnız mətn keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdıra bilər, lakin ürəklənmiş a çıqlamaların müxtəlifliyini və açıq-aydınlığını da.', 'bn': 'আধুনিক সুপারিশ ব্যবস্থায় সাধারণত ব্যবহারকারীদের কাছ থেকে মন্তব্য অথবা পর্যবেক্ষণ রয়েছে যারা বিভিন্ন বস্তুর জন্য তা এই ধরনের টেক্সচুয়াল কোর্পাসে প্রশিক্ষিত, ব্যাখ্যাত পরামর্শ মডেল ব্যবহারকারীদের স্বার্থ আবিষ্কার এবং ব্যক্তিগত ব্ যদিও ব্যাখ্যা প্রদান করতে পারে, বিদ্যমান মডেল বিভিন্ন বস্তুর জন্য বার বার্তা বা ফাঁকা বাক্যের জন্য বাক্য তৈরি করতে পারে। এটা একটি মজার প্রশ্ন শুরু করে: আমরা কি মাল্টিমোডাল পরিবেশের মডেলগুলোকে বাস্তব বিশ্বের ধারণার সঠিক সচেতনতা পেতে পারি এবং সংখ্যার উপর কমি এই কারণে আমরা দৃষ্টিশক্তিশালী প্রজন্ম এবং টেক্সটের সাহায্যে মিটের নামে দৃষ্টিশক্তিশালী প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করি: ব্যাখ্যাত পরামর্শের মডেল দেখাতে উৎসাহ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে যে এটি কি বিষয় পরীক্ষার ফলাফল এবং একটি হাতিয়াল মূল্য প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ শুধুমাত্র টেক্সটের মান বৃদ্ধি করতে পারে না, বরং তৈরি করা ব্যাখ্', 'bs': 'U modernim sistemima preporučujući, obično postoje komentari ili pregledi korisnika koji opravdavaju njihove ocjene za različite predmete. Trenirani na takvom tekstualnom korpusu, objašnjavajućim modelima preporuke naučili su otkriti interese korisnika i stvarati lične objašnjenje. Iako su u stanju pružiti uvjerljive objašnjenje, postojeći modeli obično stvaraju ponovne rečenice za različite predmete ili prazne rečenice sa nedovoljnim detaljima. Ovo postavlja zanimljivo pitanje: Možemo li zamijeniti modele u multimodalnom okruženju da dobijemo odgovarajuću svijest koncept stvarnog svijeta i olakšamo iznad nedostataka? Za taj cilj predlažemo vizualno poboljšan pristup po imenu METER sa pomoć generacije vizualizacije i teksta - slika koja odgovara diskriminaciji: model preporuke objašnjavajući se ohrabruje da vizualizira ono na šta se odnosi dok se suočava sa kaznom ako vizualizacija nije u skladu s tekstualnim objašnjenjem. Eksperimentalni rezultati i ručna procjena pokazuju da naš pristup može poboljšati ne samo kvalitet teksta, već i raznolikost i objašnjivost proizvedenih objašnjenja.', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա խորհրդատվող համակարգերում սովորաբար օգտագործողների կողմից կան մեկնաբանություններ կամ վերլուծություններ, որոնք արդարացնում են իրենց գնահատականները տարբեր առարկաների համար: Այդ տեքստալ կորպուսի վրա վարժեցված, բացատրելի խորհուրդ-մոդելները սովորում են բացահայտել օգտագործողների հետաքրքրությունները և ստեղծել անձնական բացատրություններ: Though able to provide plausible explanations, existing models tend to generate repeated sentences for different items or empty sentences with insufficient details.  Սա հետաքրքիր հարց է առաջացնում. արդյո՞ք մենք կարող ենք մոդելները ներխուժել բազմամոդալ միջավայրում, որպեսզի հասկանանք իրական աշխարհի գաղափարները և նվազեցնենք բացակայությունները: Այս նպատակով, մենք առաջարկում ենք տեսողական բարելավված մոտեցում, որը կոչվում է Մետեր, օգտագործելով տեսողական սերունդը և տեքստը, պատկերը համապատասխանում է խտրականությանը. բացատրելի խորհուրդ-մոդելը խրախուսում է տեսնել, թե ինչի մասին է խորհուրդը վերաբերվում, մինչդեռ պատիժ է հանձնվում, եթե տես Փորձարկվող արդյունքները և ձեռքի գնահատումը ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը կարող է ոչ միայն բարելավել տեքստի որակը, այլ նաև ստեղծված բացատրությունների բազմազանությունը և բացատրելիությունը:', 'ca': "En sistemes moderns de recomanadors, normalment hi ha comentaris o revisions dels usuaris que justifiquen les seves valoracions per diferents objectes. Formats en aquest corpus textual, els models de recomendació explicables aprenen a descobrir interessos dels usuaris i a generar explicacions personalitzades. Malgrat poder proporcionar explicacions plausibles, els models existents tendeixen a generar frases repetidas per diferents objectes o frases buides amb detalls insuficients. Això provoca una pregunta interessant: podem submergir els models en un entorn multimodal per aconseguir una consciència adequada dels conceptes del món real i aliviar les deficiències? A aquest efecte, proposem un enfocament millorat visualment anomenat METER amb l'ajuda de la generació de visualització i el text - imatge que coincideix amb la discriminació: el model explicable de recomendació està animat a visualitzar el que es refereix mentre infligeix una pena si la visualització no coincideix amb l'explicació textual. Els resultats experimentals i una evaluació manual demostren que el nostre enfocament pot millorar no només la qualitat del text, sinó també la diversitat i l'explicabilitat de les explicacions generades.", 'cs': 'V moderních doporučovacích systémech se obvykle objevují komentáře nebo recenze uživatelů, které zdůvodní jejich hodnocení pro různé položky. Vysvětlitelné doporučovací modely se naučí objevovat uživatelské zájmy a generovat personalizovaná vysvětlení. I když jsou schopny poskytnout věrohodné vysvětlení, existující modely mají tendenci generovat opakované věty pro různé položky nebo prázdné věty s nedostatečnými detaily. To vyvolává zajímavou otázku: můžeme modely ponořit do multimodálního prostředí, abychom získali řádné povědomí o konceptech reálného světa a zmírnili výše uvedené nedostatky? Za tímto účelem navrhujeme vizuálně vylepšený přístup s názvem METER za pomoci generování vizualizace a diskriminace přiřazování textu-obrazu: vysvětlitelný doporučovací model je podporován k vizualizaci toho, na co se vztahuje, přičemž vzniká trest, pokud vizualizace není v souladu s textovým vysvětlením. Experimentální výsledky a manuální hodnocení ukazují, že náš přístup může zlepšit nejen kvalitu textu, ale také rozmanitost a vysvětlitelnost generovaných vysvětlení.', 'et': 'Kaasaegsetes soovitussüsteemides on tavaliselt kasutajate kommentaare või ülevaateid, mis õigustavad oma hinnanguid erinevatele toodetele. Sellisel tekstikorpusel koolitatud selgitatavad soovitusmudelid õpivad avastama kasutajate huvisid ja looma isikupäraseid selgitusi. Kuigi olemasolevad mudelid suudavad pakkuda usutavaid selgitusi, kipuvad olemasolevad mudelid genereerima korduvaid lauseid erinevate üksuste jaoks või tühjad laused ebapiisavate üksikasjadega. See tekitab huvitava küsimuse: kas me saame kasutada mudelid multimodaalsesse keskkonda, et saada nõuetekohast teadlikkust reaalmaailma kontseptsioonidest ja leevendada eespool nimetatud puudusi? Selleks pakume välja visuaalselt täiustatud lähenemisviisi nimega METER visualiseerimise genereerimise ja teksti-pildi sobivuse diskrimineerimise abil: selgitatavat soovitusmudelit julgustatakse visualiseerima, millele see viitab, kandes samas karistust, kui visualiseerimine ei vasta tekstiseletusele. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused ja käsitsi hindamine näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis ei suuda parandada mitte ainult teksti kvaliteeti, vaid ka genereeritud selgituste mitmekesisust ja selgitatavust.', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaisissa suosittelijﾃ､rjestelmissﾃ､ on yleensﾃ､ kﾃ､yttﾃ､jien kommentteja tai arvosteluja, jotka oikeuttavat eri kohteiden luokituksen. Selittﾃ､vﾃ､t suositusmallit oppivat lﾃｶytﾃ､mﾃ､ﾃ､n kﾃ､yttﾃ､jien kiinnostuksen kohteet ja luomaan yksilﾃｶllisiﾃ､ selityksiﾃ､. Vaikka olemassa olevat mallit pystyvﾃ､t antamaan uskottavia selityksiﾃ､, ne yleensﾃ､ tuottavat toistuvia lauseita eri kohteille tai tyhjiﾃ､ lauseita, joissa ei ole riittﾃ､vﾃ､sti yksityiskohtia. Tﾃ､mﾃ､ herﾃ､ttﾃ､ﾃ､ mielenkiintoisen kysymyksen: voimmeko upottaa mallit multimodaaliseen ympﾃ､ristﾃｶﾃｶn saadaksemme asianmukaista tietoisuutta reaalimaailman kﾃ､sitteistﾃ､ ja lieventﾃ､ﾃ､ksemme edellﾃ､ mainittuja puutteita? Tﾃ､tﾃ､ varten ehdotamme visuaalisesti tehostettua METER-nimistﾃ､ lﾃ､hestymistapaa visualisoinnin generoinnin ja tekstin ja kuvan tﾃ､smﾃ､yttﾃ､misen avulla: selitettﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､ suositusmallia kannustetaan visualisoimaan, mihin se viittaa, samalla kun siihen kohdistuu rangaistus, jos visualisointi on ristiriidassa tekstin selityksen kanssa. Kokeelliset tulokset ja manuaalinen arviointi osoittavat, ettﾃ､ lﾃ､hestymistapamme voi parantaa paitsi tekstin laatua myﾃｶs luotujen selitysten monimuotoisuutta ja selitettﾃ､vyyttﾃ､.', 'jv': 'Nang sistem sing mroleh mrolehku, sing dikarepaké karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo perusahaan nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang sampeyan. Rasané awak dhéwé karo koyo textual, maneh dumadhi model sing nyimpen karo ngono nggawe perusahaan sampeyan karo ngono nggawe akeh perusahaan [OPTION...] Iki wis an a sakjane sing dibenalke: iso nggunakake model ning sakjane multimodal karo iso nggawe barang awak dhéwé kuwi ngregani aturan sing luwih apik lan alam iki ngono nggawe barang kelas telu nggawe Saiki iki, kéné supoyo sistem sing nêmên anyar luwih apik lan nganggo MEMET karo bantuan nggambar kelangan winihing lan teks - gambar kelangan gambar kelangan winih: model anêmên sing paling nêmên, dadi bisa nguasar suarané supoyo sak ngerasai winih sing beraksi ben garip ketemut. Perintah sing paling-perintah lan assendasi manuké mungkisan wong kuwi dianggap awak dhéwé iso nglanggar kuwi kaluwargane seneng pisan seneng pisan karo perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno Panjenengan langgar sampek Panjenengan', 'sk': 'V sodobnih sistemih priporočil običajno obstajajo komentarji ali pregledi uporabnikov, ki upravičujejo njihove ocene za različne elemente. Ob usposabljanju na takšnem besedilnem korpusu se pojasnljivi modeli priporočil naučijo odkrivati interese uporabnikov in ustvariti prilagojene razlage. Čeprav obstoječi modeli lahko zagotovijo verodostojne razlage, ponavljajo se stavki za različne elemente ali prazne stavke z nezadostnimi podrobnostmi. To postavlja zanimivo vprašanje: ali lahko modele potopimo v multimodalno okolje, da bi se ustrezno zavedali konceptov realnega sveta in ublažili nad pomanjkljivostmi? V ta namen predlagamo vizualno izboljšan pristop z imenom METER s pomočjo ustvarjanja vizualizacije in diskriminacije ujemanja besedila-slike: pojasnljiv model priporočil spodbuja k vizualizaciji, na kaj se nanaša, hkrati pa se kaznuje, če je vizualizacija neskladna z besedilno razlago. Eksperimentalni rezultati in ročna ocena kažejo, da lahko naš pristop izboljša ne le kakovost besedila, temveč tudi raznolikost in pojasnljivost ustvarjenih pojasnil.', 'he': 'במערכות המלצות המודרניות, יש בדרך כלל תגובות או ביקורות משתמשים שמצדקים את ההערכות שלהם עבור פריטים שונים. מאומנים על קורפוס טקסטלי כזה, דוגמני המלצה מסבירים ללמוד לגלות אינטרסים משתמשים וליצור הסברים אישיים. למרות שיכולים לספק הסברים אמינים, דוגמנים קיימים נוטים לייצר משפטים חוזרים עבור פריטים שונים או משפטים ריקים עם פרטים לא מספיק. זה מעניין שאלה מעניינת: האם אנחנו יכולים להשקיע את הדוגמנים בסביבה multimodal כדי להשיג מודעות נכונה למחשבות בעולם האמיתי ולקל מעל חסרונות? למטרה זו, אנו מציעים גישה משותפת באופן חזותי בשם METER עם עזרה של דור ויזואליזציה וטקסט - תמונה תואמת ההבדל: מודל המלצה המסביר מעודד לדמיין מה הוא מתייחס אליו בזמן שנוצא עונש אם הוויזואליזציה אינה תואמת עם ההסבר הטקסטלי. תוצאות ניסיוניות וערכה ידנית מראות שהגישה שלנו יכולה לשפר לא רק את איכות הטקסט, אלא גם את המגווון וההסבר של ההסברים המיוצרים.', 'bo': 'ད་ལྟོའི་ཁྲོད་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོའི་རིམ་པ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མཆན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན། སློབ་གླེང་ན་འདི་དག་གི་ཡིག་ཚང་མཁན་གྱི་སྐོར་ལས། འགྲེལ་བཤད་རུང་བའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྤྱད་ནས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་འ ངོས་འཛིན་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་མིན་པར་སྤྲོད་ཐུབ་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་དག་གི་མིག་སྔར་ཡོད་པའི་མིག་སྔར་སྟོན་པའི་ཚིག འདི་ལ་གནས་ཚུལ་མཚམས་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་རེད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འདྲེན་གྱི་སྣ་མཐུད་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཚུགས་མ་འོང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ནུས་མཐོང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིག་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དང་མིང་ཡུལ་གྱི་རོགས་འདྲེན་བ་དང་། བརྙན་རིས་མཐོང་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་དཔེ་གཏན་ཁེལ་ཅན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་སྟོན་རུང་བའ Experimental results and a manual assessment demonstrate that our approach can improve not only the text quality but also the diversity and explainability of the generated explanations.', 'ha': "Daga cikin tsarin mai shawarar da aka yanzu, ana sami koma ga masu amfani da shi, waɗanda ke halatta rabon sigogi wa abubuwa masu daban. An sanar da shi a kan wannan nau'in rubutu, misãlai masu shawara da bã za su iya fahimta wa'azi kuma su sami fassarar da ɗabi'a. Kuma kõ da ya iya bãyar da fassarar da wanda za'a iya ƙididdige, misãlai da ke gaba, yana da amfani da su ƙiƙira cire-sauri wa abun daban-daban ko kuma da saurãre masu komai da kuma ba da kuma buƙata fassara ba. Wannan yana fara wani tambayi mai sha'awa: Shin, za mu iya buɗe misalin a cikin mazaɓa mai multi-multi dõmin ya sãmu fahimta masu halali ga fassarar-duniya da kuma mu sauƙa ƙe a kan manyan ƙarami? Ga wannan, Munã goyyar da wata hanyor da aka samar da gane da jinansa MEMEMER da taimakon kizafi da zane-zane wanda ya yi kami da yin sauri: An kwaɗayi wa misalin shawarar da ba'a bayyana shi ba dõmin ka gane shi a lokacin da za'a kiyaye azãba idan gani ba ta sami da fassarar littãfi. Matarin jarrabai da hakarin hannayenmu sun nuna cewa hanyarmu bã zai iya improve tsarin matsayin kawai, kuma amma da da yawa da fassarar da fassarar da aka ƙãga."}
{'en': 'Composable Sparse Fine-Tuning for Cross-Lingual Transfer', 'ar': 'اكتشاف نية جديدة من خلال التدريب المسبق والتعلم التفاعلي', 'fr': 'Découverte de nouvelles intentions avec pré-formation et apprentissage contrastif', 'es': 'Descubrimiento de nuevas intenciones con preentrenamiento y aprendizaje contrastivo', 'pt': 'Descoberta de novas intenções com pré-treinamento e aprendizagem contrastiva', 'ja': '事前トレーニングと対照的な学習による新しい意図の発見', 'zh': '以预训练比学见新意', 'hi': 'पूर्व प्रशिक्षण और Contrastive सीखने के साथ नई इरादा खोज', 'ru': 'Новое намерение с предварительным обучением и контрастным обучением', 'ga': 'Fionnachtain Rúin Nua le Réamh-oiliúint agus Foghlaim Chodarsnachta', 'ka': 'ახალი ინტენტინტი განსხვავება პრე- განსხვავება და კონტრესტიგური სწავლება', 'el': 'Νέα ανακάλυψη προθέσεων με προεκπαίδευση και αντιφατική μάθηση', 'hu': 'Új szándék felfedezése előképzéssel és kontrasztív tanulással', 'it': 'Nuova Intent Discovery con Pre-training e Contrastive Learning', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқыту мен контрастық оқыту арқылы жаңа жетілдіру', 'lt': 'Naujų ketinimų atradimas parengiamuoju mokymu ir kontrastiniu mokymu', 'mk': 'Ново откривање со предобука и контрастивно учење', 'ml': 'പുതിയ പരിശീലനത്തിനും വിവരങ്ങളും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും കൊണ്ട് പുതിയ ഉള്ള കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Penemuan Cipta Baru dengan Latihan Sebelum dan Belajar Kontrastif', 'mt': 'Skoperta Intenzjoni Ġdida bi Taħriġ ta’ Qabel u Tagħlim Kontrastiv', 'mn': 'Өмнөх суралцах болон эсрэг суралцах', 'pl': 'Nowe Intent Discovery z przedszkoleniem i kontrastywnym uczeniem się', 'no': 'Ny intentoppdaging med føreøving og kontrastiv læring', 'ro': 'Noua Intenție Descoperită cu Pre-training și Învățare Contrastivă', 'sr': 'Nova intenzivna otkrića sa predobukom i kontrastivnim učenjem', 'si': 'මුලින් ප්\u200dරධානය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Baaritaanka cusub ee waxbarasho-horaadka iyo iskuulka xiriirka', 'sv': 'Ny Intent Discovery med Pre-Training och Contrastive Learning', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சி மற்றும் தொடர்பு படிப்புடன் புதிய உள்ளடக்கம் கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'پہلے تربین اور کنٹرسٹیو سیکھنے کے ساتھ نیا مضبوط دیسکوری', 'uz': 'Taò¥rifi va taò¥minlovchi taò¥minlovchi boò£yicha yangi qidirish', 'vi': 'Sự phân tích mới trong dự án và tương phản học', 'hr': 'Novo namjerno otkrivanje s predobukom i kontrastivnim učenjem', 'nl': 'Nieuwe Intent Discovery met Pre-training en Contrastive Learning', 'bg': 'Ново откриване на намерения с предобучение и контрастивно обучение', 'da': 'Ny Intent Discovery med forudgående træning og kontrastiv læring', 'de': 'Neue Intent Discovery mit Pre-Training und kontrastivem Lernen', 'id': 'Penemuan Berniat Baru dengan Latihan Sebelumnya dan Belajar Kontrastif', 'ko': '사전 교육과 비교 학습을 통해 새로운 아이디어를 발견하다', 'fa': 'کشف جدید با آموزش پیش آموزش و یادگیری متفاوت', 'sw': 'Tafsiri mpya ya Ujadala na Ufunzi Mkuu', 'tr': 'Öňki okuwçy we kontrast öwrenmek bilen täze intensity keşif', 'af': 'Nuwe Intent Discovery met vooraf- oefening en kontrastiewe leer', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i ri i qëllimit me trajnimin paraprak dhe mësimin kontrastues', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Նոր մտադրությունների հայտնաբերումը նախավարժման և հակադրական սովորելու միջոցով', 'az': '칐n t톛hsil v톛 Kontrast 칐yr톛nm톛si il톛 Yeni 칐yr톛nm톛', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষণ ও পরিচিতি শিক্ষার সাথে নতুন ইন্টেন্ট ডিস্কিউরি', 'bs': 'Novo namjerno otkrivanje sa predobukom i kontrastivnim učenjem', 'cs': 'Nový Intent Discovery s předškolením a kontrastním učením', 'ca': "Nova descoberta d'intenció amb l'aprenentatge preconsistent i contrastant", 'fi': 'Uusi aikeiden löytäminen esikoulutuksella ja kontrastiivisella oppimisella', 'et': 'Uus kavatsuste avastamine eelkoolituse ja kontrastiivse õppega', 'sk': 'Novo odkritje namenov s predusposabljanjem in kontrastivnim učenjem', 'he': 'New Intent Discovery with Pre-training and Contrastive Learning', 'jv': 'New', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲོས་དང་སྦྱོར་བའི་ཤེས་ཚད་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་དང་འཛིན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པ་གསརཔ་སྦྱར་བ'}
{'en': 'Fine-tuning the entire set of parameters of a large pretrained model has become the mainstream approach for transfer learning. To increase its efficiency and prevent catastrophic forgetting and interference, techniques like adapters and sparse fine-tuning have been developed. Adapters are modular, as they can be combined to adapt a model towards different facets of knowledge (e.g., dedicated language and/or task adapters). Sparse fine-tuning is expressive, as it controls the behavior of all model components. In this work, we introduce a new fine-tuning method with both these desirable properties. In particular, we learn sparse, real-valued masks based on a simple variant of the Lottery Ticket Hypothesis. Task-specific masks are obtained from annotated data in a source language, and language-specific masks from masked language modeling in a target language. Both these masks can then be composed with the pretrained model. Unlike adapter-based fine-tuning, this method neither increases the number of parameters at inference time nor alters the original model architecture. Most importantly, it outperforms adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer by a large margin in a series of multilingual benchmarks, including Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, and AmericasNLI. Based on an in-depth analysis, we additionally find that sparsity is crucial to prevent both 1) interference between the fine-tunings to be composed and 2) overfitting. We release the code and models at https://github.com/cambridgeltl/composable-sft.', 'ar': 'يهدف اكتشاف النية الجديد إلى الكشف عن فئات النوايا الجديدة من تصريحات المستخدم لتوسيع مجموعة فئات النوايا المدعومة. إنها مهمة حاسمة لتطوير وتوسيع خدمة نظام حوار عملي. على الرغم من أهميتها ، إلا أن هذه المشكلة لا تزال قيد الاستكشاف في الأدبيات. تعتمد المناهج الحالية عادةً على كمية كبيرة من الكلمات المصنفة وتستخدم طرق وضع العلامات الزائفة لتعلم التمثيل والتجميع ، والتي تتطلب تسمية مكثفة وغير فعالة وغير دقيقة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم حلولًا جديدة لسؤالين بحثيين مهمين لاكتشاف النية الجديدة: (1) كيفية تعلم تمثيلات النطق الدلالي و (2) كيفية تحسين الكلام العنقودي. على وجه الخصوص ، نقترح أولاً استراتيجية متعددة المهام قبل التدريب للاستفادة من البيانات الثرية غير المسماة جنبًا إلى جنب مع البيانات الخارجية المسمى لتعلم التمثيل. بعد ذلك ، نصمم خسارة تباين جديدة لاستغلال إشارات الإشراف الذاتي في البيانات غير المسماة للتجميع. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على ثلاثة معايير للتعرف على النية الفعالية العالية لطريقتنا المقترحة ، والتي تتفوق على أحدث الأساليب بهامش كبير في كل من السيناريوهات غير الخاضعة للإشراف وشبه الإشراف. ستتوفر شفرة المصدر على \\ url {https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}.', 'fr': "La découverte de nouvelles intentions vise à découvrir de nouvelles catégories d'intention à partir des énoncés utilisateur afin d'élargir l'ensemble des classes d'intention prises en charge. Il s'agit d'une tâche essentielle pour le développement et l'extension des services d'un système de dialogue pratique. Malgré son importance, ce problème reste sous-exploré dans la littérature. Les approches existantes reposent généralement sur un grand nombre d'énoncés étiquetés et utilisent des méthodes de pseudo-étiquetage pour l'apprentissage des représentations et le regroupement, qui sont gourmandes en étiquettes, inefficaces et imprécises. Dans cet article, nous proposons de nouvelles solutions à deux questions de recherche importantes pour la découverte de nouvelles intentions\xa0: (1) comment apprendre les représentations d'énoncés sémantiques et (2) comment mieux regrouper les énoncés. En particulier, nous proposons d'abord une stratégie de pré-formation multitâche afin d'exploiter des données riches non étiquetées ainsi que des données étiquetées externes pour l'apprentissage des représentations. Ensuite, nous concevons une nouvelle perte de contraste pour exploiter les signaux d'auto-supervision dans les données non étiquetées pour le clustering. Des expériences approfondies sur trois points de référence de reconnaissance d'intention démontrent la grande efficacité de notre méthode proposée, qui surpasse largement les méthodes de pointe dans les scénarios non supervisés et semi-supervisés. Le code source sera disponible sur\xa0\\ url {https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}.", 'es': 'El nuevo descubrimiento de intenciones tiene como objetivo descubrir categorías de intención novedosas a partir de las declaraciones de los usuarios para ampliar el conjunto de clases de intención admitidas. Es una tarea fundamental para el desarrollo y la expansión de los servicios de un sistema de diálogo práctico. A pesar de su importancia, este problema sigue siendo poco explorado en la literatura. Los enfoques existentes generalmente se basan en una gran cantidad de enunciados etiquetados y emplean métodos de pseudoetiquetado para el aprendizaje de la representación y la agrupación, que requieren mucho uso de etiquetas, son ineficientes e inexactos. En este artículo, ofrecemos nuevas soluciones a dos preguntas de investigación importantes para el descubrimiento de nuevas intenciones: (1) cómo aprender las representaciones semánticas de enunciados y (2) cómo agrupar mejor los enunciados. En particular, primero proponemos una estrategia de capacitación previa a múltiples tareas para aprovechar los datos enriquecidos sin etiqueta junto con los datos etiquetados externos para el aprendizaje de la representación. Luego, diseñamos una nueva pérdida contrastiva para aprovechar las señales de autosupervisión en datos no etiquetados para la agrupación en clústeres. Experimentos exhaustivos en tres puntos de referencia de reconocimiento de intenciones demuestran la alta eficacia de nuestro método propuesto, que supera a los métodos más avanzados por un amplio margen tanto en escenarios no supervisados como semisupervisados. El código fuente estará disponible en\\ url {https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}.', 'pt': 'A nova descoberta de intenção visa descobrir novas categorias de intenção de enunciados do usuário para expandir o conjunto de classes de intenção suportadas. É uma tarefa crítica para o desenvolvimento e expansão do serviço de um sistema de diálogo prático. Apesar de sua importância, este problema permanece pouco explorado na literatura. As abordagens existentes normalmente dependem de uma grande quantidade de enunciados rotulados e empregam métodos de pseudo-rotulagem para aprendizado de representação e agrupamento, que são intensivos em rótulos, ineficientes e imprecisos. Neste artigo, fornecemos novas soluções para duas importantes questões de pesquisa para a descoberta de novas intenções: (1) como aprender representações semânticas de enunciados e (2) como melhor agrupar enunciados. Particularmente, propomos primeiro uma estratégia de pré-treinamento multitarefa para alavancar dados não rotulados ricos junto com dados rotulados externos para aprendizado de representação. Em seguida, projetamos uma nova perda contrastiva para explorar sinais de autosupervisão em dados não rotulados para agrupamento. Extensos experimentos em três benchmarks de reconhecimento de intenção demonstram a alta eficácia do nosso método proposto, que supera os métodos de última geração por uma grande margem em cenários não supervisionados e semisupervisionados. O código-fonte estará disponível em \\url{https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}.', 'zh': '新意向见旨在用户语中得新意向类,以广受助之意类集。 此开广实用对话系统之要务也。 虽然此事重,文献未穷讨。 今法常依大记之言,而伪为学聚类,其法多占效率低且不正。 于本文中,为新意所见二要,供新解决方案:(1)学语义语(2)善语聚类。 先建一多任务预练之策,以利用丰衍之数,外标数以示学焉。 然后设一新对耗,以利用未标数自督聚类。 三意识准实验证吾高效性,其法在无监督、半监之中,皆大优于先进之法。 源代码将给 \\url{https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN} 。', 'hi': 'नई इरादे की खोज का उद्देश्य समर्थित इरादा वर्गों के सेट का विस्तार करने के लिए उपयोगकर्ता उच्चारण से उपन्यास आशय श्रेणियों को उजागर करना है। यह एक व्यावहारिक संवाद प्रणाली के विकास और सेवा विस्तार के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। इसके महत्व के बावजूद, यह समस्या साहित्य में कम-खोजी गई है। मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण आमतौर पर लेबल किए गए कथनों की एक बड़ी मात्रा पर भरोसा करते हैं और प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने और क्लस्टरिंग के लिए छद्म-लेबलिंग विधियों को नियोजित करते हैं, जो लेबल-गहन, अक्षम और गलत हैं। इस पेपर में, हम नए इरादे की खोज के लिए दो महत्वपूर्ण शोध प्रश्नों के लिए नए समाधान प्रदान करते हैं: (1) शब्दार्थ उच्चारण प्रतिनिधित्व कैसे सीखें और (2) क्लस्टर उच्चारण को बेहतर तरीके से कैसे सीखें। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए बाहरी लेबल वाले डेटा के साथ समृद्ध अनलेबल डेटा का लाभ उठाने के लिए एक बहु-कार्य पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण रणनीति का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। फिर, हम क्लस्टरिंग के लिए अनलेबल किए गए डेटा में स्व-पर्यवेक्षी संकेतों का फायदा उठाने के लिए एक नया कंट्रास्टिव नुकसान डिजाइन करते हैं। तीन इरादे मान्यता बेंचमार्क पर व्यापक प्रयोग हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि की उच्च प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, जो असुरक्षित और अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित दोनों परिदृश्यों में एक बड़े अंतर से अत्याधुनिक तरीकों को मात देता है। स्रोत कोड \\url{https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN} पर उपलब्ध होगा.', 'ru': 'Новое обнаружение намерений направлено на раскрытие новых категорий намерений из высказываний пользователей для расширения набора поддерживаемых классов намерений. Это критически важная задача для развития и расширения сферы услуг системы практического диалога. Несмотря на свою важность, эта проблема по-прежнему недостаточно изучена в литературе. Существующие подходы обычно основаны на большом количестве помеченных высказываний и используют методы псевдо-мечения для обучения представлению и кластеризации, которые являются интенсивными, неэффективными и неточными. В этой статье мы предлагаем новые решения двух важных исследовательских вопросов для открытия новых намерений: (1) как выучить семантические выражения и (2) как лучше кластерные выражения. В частности, сначала мы предлагаем многозадачную стратегию предварительного обучения, чтобы использовать богатые немаркированные данные вместе с внешними маркированными данными для обучения представлению. Затем мы проектируем новую контрастную потерю для использования сигналов самонаблюдения в немеченных данных для кластеризации. Обширные эксперименты по трем критериям распознавания намерений демонстрируют высокую эффективность предложенного нами метода, который превосходит современные методы по большому запасу как в неконтролируемых, так и в полуконтролируемых сценариях. Исходный код будет доступен по адресу \\url{https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}.', 'ja': '新しいインテント発見は、サポートされているインテントクラスのセットを拡張するために、ユーザーの発話から新しいインテントカテゴリを発見することを目的としています。 これは、実用的な対話システムの開発とサービス拡張のための重要なタスクです。 その重要性にもかかわらず、この問題は文献では未だに十分に探求されていない。 既存のアプローチは、典型的には、大量のラベル付けされた発話に依存し、ラベル集約的であり、非効率的であり、不正確である、表現学習およびクラスタリングのための疑似ラベル付け方法を採用する。 本稿では、新たな意図発見のための2つの重要な研究課題に新しい解決策を提供する。（ 1 ）意味論的発話表現を学ぶ方法と（ 2 ）より良い発話をクラスター化する方法である。 特に、表現学習のために外部ラベル付きデータと共に豊富なラベルなしデータを活用するためのマルチタスク事前トレーニング戦略を最初に提案します。 次に、ラベル付けされていないデータの自己監督シグナルをクラスタリングのために利用するために、新しいコントラストの損失を設計します。 3つのインテント認識ベンチマークの広範な実験は、私たちの提案された方法の高い有効性を示しています。この方法は、監督されていないシナリオと半監督されているシナリオの両方で、最先端の方法を大幅に上回っています。 ソースコードは、\\ url {https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}で入手できます。', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag fionnachtain rúin nua catagóirí rúin úra a nochtadh ó chaint úsáideoirí chun an tsraith ranganna intinne tacaithe a leathnú. Is tasc ríthábhachtach é maidir le forbairt agus leathnú seirbhíse ar chóras praiticiúil idirphlé. In ainneoin a thábhachtaí, tá an fhadhb seo fós gan iniúchadh sa litríocht. Bíonn cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana ag brath go hiondúil ar mhórchuid cainte lipéadaithe agus úsáideann siad modhanna lipéadaithe bréige chun ionadaíocht a fhoghlaim agus a bhraisliú, atá dian ar lipéad, neamhéifeachtúil agus míchruinn. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid réitigh nua ar fáil ar dhá cheist taighde thábhachtacha le haghaidh fionnachtain rúin nua: (1) conas léiriúcháin chaint shéimeantach a fhoghlaim agus (2) conas braisle níos fearr a dhéanamh ar chainteanna. Go háirithe, molaimid ar dtús straitéis réamhoiliúna il-tasc chun sonraí saibhir gan lipéad a ghiaráil mar aon le sonraí lipéadaithe seachtracha le haghaidh foghlama ionadaíochta. Ansin, déanaimid caillteanas nua codarsnachta a dhearadh chun leas a bhaint as comharthaí féin-mhaoirseachta i sonraí neamhlipéadaithe le haghaidh cnuasaithe. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar thrí thagarmharc aitheantais rúin ard-éifeachtacht ár modh molta, a sháraíonn modhanna úrscothacha go mór i gcásanna neamh-mhaoirsithe agus leath-mhaoirsithe. Beidh an cód foinse ar fáil ag \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}.', 'ka': 'ახალი საზოგადო აღმოჩვენება მიზეზია, რომ მომხმარებელი საზოგადოებებისგან აღმოჩენა ახალი საზოგადოებო კატეგორია, რომელიც მომხმარებელი საზოგა ეს პრაქტიკური დიალოგური სისტემის განვითარება და სერვისების გაფართლებისთვის კრიტიკური დავალება. მისი მნიშვნელობას მაგრამ, ეს პრობლემა უკვე განსხვავებულია ლიტერატურაში. Existing approaches typically rely on a large amount of labeled words and employ pseudo-labeling methods for representation learning and clustering, which are labelled-intensive, inefficient and inaccurate. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალი პასუხებით ორი მნიშვნელოვანი კითხვებისთვის ახალი საზოგადოება: 1) როგორ ვისწავლოთ სმენტიკური გამოსახულება და (2) როგორ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი კლასტ განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ პირველად მრავალური სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სტრაქტიფიკაციის სტრაქტიფიკაცია, რომელიც ბედნიერი არაფერილი მონაცე შემდეგ, ჩვენ ახალი კონტრასტიური დაკავშირება, რომელიც თავიდან დავამუშავებელი სიგნალეების გამოყენება კლასტერის შესაძლებლობისთვის უცნობილი მონა სამი საზოგადომის განაცნობის ბენქმარკების გამოსახულებული ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ მეტის მაღალი ეფექტიურობა, რომელიც უფრო მეტი წარმოიდგინეთ მსოფლიოს მეტი, რომელიც დიდი მარტი მიმდინარე კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'hu': 'Az új szándék-felfedezés célja, hogy új szándékkategóriákat fedezzen fel a felhasználók kimondásaitól a támogatott szándékok osztályának kiterjesztése érdekében. Ez kulcsfontosságú feladat egy gyakorlati párbeszédrendszer fejlesztéséhez és szolgáltatásbővítéséhez. Jelentősége ellenére ez a probléma továbbra sem vizsgálatos az irodalomban. A meglévő megközelítések jellemzően nagy mennyiségű címkézett kifejezésre támaszkodnak, és pszeudo-címkézési módszereket alkalmaznak a reprezentációs tanulás és a klaszterezés során, amelyek címkeintenzívak, nem hatékonyak és pontatlanok. Ebben a tanulmányban két fontos kutatási kérdésre nyújtunk új megoldást: (1) hogyan lehet megtanulni a szemantikai kifejezések reprezentációját és (2) hogyan lehet jobban megtanulni a klaszterek kifejezéseit. Különösen egy többfeladatos előképzési stratégiát javasolunk, amelynek célja a gazdag, címke nélküli adatok és a külső címkézett adatok felhasználása a reprezentációs tanulás céljából. Ezt követően új kontrasztos veszteséget tervezünk, hogy a címke nélküli adatokban található önfelügyeleti jeleket kihasználjuk a klaszterezés céljából. Három szándékfelismerési referenciaértéken végzett kiterjedt kísérletek bizonyítják javasolt módszerünk nagy hatékonyságát, amely mind felügyelet nélküli, mind félig felügyelt forgatókönyvekben nagy mértékben felülmúlja a korszerű módszereket. A forráskód elérhető lesz az \\url{címen https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'el': 'Η νέα ανακάλυψη προθέσεων στοχεύει στην αποκάλυψη νέων κατηγοριών προθέσεων από τις δηλώσεις χρηστών για να επεκτείνει το σύνολο υποστηριζόμενων κλάδων προθέσεων. Αποτελεί κρίσιμο καθήκον για την ανάπτυξη και την επέκταση των υπηρεσιών ενός πρακτικού συστήματος διαλόγου. Παρά τη σημασία του, το πρόβλημα αυτό παραμένει υποδιερευνημένο στη βιβλιογραφία. Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις βασίζονται συνήθως σε μεγάλο αριθμό επισημασμένων εκφράσεων και χρησιμοποιούν μεθόδους ψευδομαρτοποίησης για την εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης και την ομαδοποίηση, οι οποίες είναι εντατικές σε ετικέτες, αναποτελεσματικές και ανακριβείς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρέχουμε νέες λύσεις σε δύο σημαντικά ερευνητικά ερωτήματα για την ανακάλυψη νέων προθέσεων: (1) πώς να μάθετε σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις εκφρασμού και (2) πώς να ομαδοποιήσετε καλύτερα εκφωνήσεις. Ειδικότερα, προτείνουμε πρώτα μια στρατηγική προ-κατάρτισης πολλαπλών εργασιών για να αξιοποιήσουμε πλούσια δεδομένα χωρίς ετικέτα μαζί με εξωτερικά δεδομένα με ετικέτα για τη μάθηση αναπαράστασης. Στη συνέχεια, σχεδιάζουμε μια νέα αντιδιαστατική απώλεια για την εκμετάλλευση αυτοεποπτικών σημάτων σε δεδομένα χωρίς σήμανση για ομαδοποίηση. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε τρία σημεία αναφοράς αναγνώρισης προθέσεων καταδεικνύουν την υψηλή αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου μας, η οποία ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο τόσο σε μη εποπτευόμενα όσο και ημιεποπτευόμενα σενάρια. Ο πηγαίος κώδικας θα είναι διαθέσιμος στο \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'it': "La nuova scoperta degli intenti mira a scoprire nuove categorie di intenti dalle dichiarazioni degli utenti per espandere l'insieme delle classi di intenti supportate. Si tratta di un compito fondamentale per lo sviluppo e l'espansione dei servizi di un sistema di dialogo pratico. Nonostante la sua importanza, questo problema rimane poco esplorato nella letteratura. Gli approcci esistenti in genere si basano su una grande quantità di dichiarazioni etichettate e utilizzano metodi di pseudo-etichettatura per l'apprendimento della rappresentazione e il clustering, che sono intensivi di etichette, inefficienti e imprecisi. In questo articolo, forniamo nuove soluzioni a due importanti domande di ricerca per la scoperta di nuovi intenti: (1) come imparare le rappresentazioni semantiche dell'espressione e (2) come migliorare le espressioni del cluster. In particolare, proponiamo innanzitutto una strategia di pre-formazione multi-task per sfruttare dati ricchi e non etichettati insieme a dati esterni etichettati per l'apprendimento della rappresentazione. Quindi, progettiamo una nuova perdita contrastante per sfruttare i segnali di auto-vigilanza nei dati non etichettati per il clustering. Esperimenti approfonditi su tre benchmark di riconoscimento degli intenti dimostrano l'elevata efficacia del nostro metodo proposto, che supera di gran lunga i metodi all'avanguardia sia in scenari non supervisionati che semi-supervisionati. Il codice sorgente sarà disponibile all'indirizzo \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.", 'kk': 'Жаңа мақсатты табу мақсатты пайдаланушылардың сөздерінен жаңа мақсатты санаттарын ашу үшін қолданылатын мақсатты класс жиынын кеңейтуге болады. Бұл практикалық диалог жүйесінің жасау және қызметтердің кеңейтуі үшін маңызды тапсырма. Бұл мәселе әдебиеттің көпшілігін зерттеп тұрады. Бар жағдайлар әдетте жарлық сөздердің үлкен мәліметтеріне тәуелді және білім және кластерлерді көрсету үшін псевдо- жарлықтау әдістерін қолданады. Бұл жарлықтардың тең, жеткілікті және дұрыс Бұл қағазда, жаңа мақсатты табу үшін екі маңызды зерттеу сұрақтарына жаңа шешімдерді береміз: (1) семантикалық сөздерді қалай оқыту және (2) кластердің сөздерін қалай жақсы оқыту. Мәселен, біріншіден бірнеше тапсырманың алдын- ала оқыту стратегиясын қолдануға арналған деректерді бағалау үшін, сыртқы жарлық мәліметтер үшін мәліметтерді қолдануға ар Содан кейін, біз кластерлік үшін жаңа контрастық жоғалуды құрамыз. Үш мақсатты түсініктердің кеңейтілген тәжірибелері қолданылатын тәжірибелеріміздің жоғары ең эффективнігін көрсетеді. Бұл әртүрлі тәжірибелерді күй- жай тәжірибелердің күй- жай тәсілдеріне Бастапқы код\\\\ url{ дегенде бар болады https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'lt': 'New intent discovery aims to uncover novel intent categories from user utterances to expand the set of supported intent classes.  Tai labai svarbi užduotis plėtoti ir plėtoti praktinio dialogo sistemą. Nepaisant jos svarbos, ši problema literatūroje tebėra nepakankamai išnagrinėta. Esami metodai paprastai grindžiami dideliu kiekiu pažymėtų žodžių ir naudojami pseudo ženklinimo metodai reprezentaciniam mokymuisi ir klasifikavimui, kurie yra intensyvūs etiketėms, neveiksmingi ir netikslūs. Šiame dokumente siūlome naujus sprendimus dviem svarbiems mokslinių tyrimų klausimams, susijusiems su naujų ketinimų atradimu: 1) kaip mokytis semantinių išraiškų atstovavimų ir 2) kaip geriau susijungti išraiškas. Visų pirma pirmiausia siūlome daugiafunkčią parengiamojo mokymo strategiją, kuria siekiama sutelkti daug nepažymėtų duomenų ir išorinių pažymėtų duomenų, skirtų mokymuisi atstovauti. Tuomet sukūrėme naują kontrastinį nuostolią, kad būtų galima panaudoti savarankiškos priežiūros signalus neklasifikuotuose duomenų grupavimui. Išsamūs eksperimentai su trimis ketinimų pripažinimo lyginamaisiais rodikliais rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas metodas yra labai veiksmingas, o jo rezultatai yra daug didesni už pažangiausius metodus tiek nepastebimuose, tiek pusiau prižiūrimuose scenarijuose. The source code will be available at \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'ms': 'New intent discovery aims to uncover novel intent categories from user utterances to expand the set of supported intent classes.  It is a critical task for the development and service expansion of a practical dialogue system.  Walaupun pentingnya, masalah ini masih belum dikesan dalam literatur. Pendekatan yang wujud biasanya bergantung pada jumlah besar ucapan yang ditabel dan menggunakan kaedah pseudo-labeling untuk pembelajaran mewakili dan clustering, yang adalah label-intensiv, tidak efektif, dan tidak tepat. In this paper, we provide new solutions to two important research questions for new intent discovery: (1) how to learn semantic utterance representations and (2) how to better cluster utterances.  Particularly, we first propose a multi-task pre-training strategy to leverage rich unlabeled data along with external labeled data for representation learning.  Kemudian, kita merancang kerugian kontras baru untuk mengeksploitasi isyarat pengawasan diri dalam data tidak berlebihan untuk berkumpul. Eksperimen luas pada tiga tanda referensi pengenalan tujuan menunjukkan keefektivitas tinggi kaedah yang kami cadangkan, yang melampaui kaedah-kaedah state-of-the-art dengan margin besar dalam skenario yang tidak diawasi dan semi-mengawasi. Kod sumber akan tersedia pada \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'ml': 'പുതിയ ലക്ഷ്യം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു ഒരു പ്രാക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും ഇത് ഒരു പ്രധാ അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെങ്കിലും ഈ പ്രശ്നം സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള അടുത്തുവരുന്ന സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതും ക്ലോസ്റ്റര്\u200dട്ടിങ്ങിനും പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിനും പ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, പുതിയ നിരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള രണ്ട് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരിശോധന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ പരിഹാരം നല്\u200dകുന്നു: (1) എങ്ങനെയാണ്  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു multi-task-pre-training strategy പ്രാദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. സമ്പന്നരായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ പരിസ്ഥിതിയുടെ നഷ്ടത്തെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന സിഗ്നലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗി മൂന്നു തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയുടെ ഉയര്\u200dച്ചയായ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് സ ഉറവിട കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാകും\\url { https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN {0}', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta ta’ intenzjoni ġdida għandha l-għan li tikber kategoriji ta’ intenzjoni ġdida minn dikjarazzjonijiet tal-utent biex tespandi s-sett ta’ klassijiet ta’ intenzjoni appoġġjati. Hija kompitu kritiku għall-iżvilupp u l-espansjoni tas-servizzi ta’ sistema ta’ djalogu prattiku. Minkejja l-importanza tagħha, din il-problema għadha mhux esplorata biżżejjed fil-letteratura. Existing approaches typically rely on a large amount of labeled utterances and employ pseudo-labeling methods for representation learning and clustering, which are label-intensive, inefficient, and inaccurate.  In this paper, we provide new solutions to two important research questions for new intent discovery: (1) how to learn semantic utterance representations and (2) how to better cluster utterances.  B’mod partikolari, l-ewwel nett nipproponu strateġija ta’ qabel it-taħriġ b’ħafna kompiti biex inħeġġu dejta rikka mingħajr tikketta flimkien ma’ dejta esterna tikkettata għat-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza. Then, we design a new contrastive loss to exploit self-supervisory signals in unlabeled data for clustering.  Esperimenti estensivi fuq tliet punti ta’ riferiment għar-rikonoxximent tal-intenzjoni juru l-effettività għolja tal-metodu propost tagħna, li jeċċedi l-metodi l-aktar avvanzati b’marġini kbir kemm fix-xenarji mhux sorveljati kif ukoll f’dawk semisorveljati. Il- kodiċi tas- sors se jkun disponibbli fuq \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'mn': 'Шинэ зорилго олох нь хэрэглэгчийн хэлэлцээс шинэ зорилго нээж, дэмжигдэх зорилго классийг нэмэгдүүлэх зорилго юм. Энэ бол практикийн диалог системийн хөгжлийн болон үйлчилгээний дэвшилтийн чухал ажил. Энэ асуудал уран зохиолд хамаагүй байдаг. Existing approaches typically rely on a large amount of labeled words and use pseudo-labeling methods for representation of learning and clustering. These are labels-intensive, inefficient, and incorrect. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ зорилго олохын тулд хоёр чухал судалгааны асуулт шинэ шийдвэр гаргадаг: (1) семантийн хэлэлцээний илтгэлийг хэрхэн сурах бөгөөд (2) хэлэлцээний илтгэлийг хэрхэн сайн сурах вэ? Ялангуяа бид эхлээд олон ажлын өмнөх сургалтын стратегийг санал болгож, баян биш мэдээллийг ашиглах боломжтой болгосон гадаад нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн санал болгож байна. Дараа нь бид өөрийгөө удирдлагатай мэдээллээр хэрэглэх шинэ эсрэг алдагдлыг зохион байгуулдаг. Гурван зорилго хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэх багц дээрх өргөн туршилтууд нь бидний санал өгсөн арга замын өндөр үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулдаг. Энэ нь урлагийн төвшин арга замыг дүрслэхгүй, хагас удирдлагагүй хувилбарууд хоёуланг ихээхэн замаар Гэхдээ эх үүсвэрийн код https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'pl': 'Nowe wykrywanie intencji ma na celu odkrycie nowych kategorii intencji z wypowiedzi użytkowników, aby rozszerzyć zestaw obsługiwanych klas intencji. Jest to zadanie kluczowe dla rozwoju i rozbudowy usług praktycznego systemu dialogu. Pomimo jego znaczenia problem ten pozostaje niedostatecznie zbadany w literaturze. Istniejące podejścia zazwyczaj opierają się na dużej ilości etykietowanych wypowiedzi i wykorzystują metody pseudo-etykietowania do uczenia się reprezentacji i klastrowania, które są intensywne etykiety, nieefektywne i niedokładne. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowe rozwiązania dwóch ważnych pytań badawczych dotyczących odkrywania nowych intencji: (1) jak nauczyć się reprezentacji wypowiedzi semantycznej i (2) jak lepiej klastrować wypowiedzi. W szczególności, najpierw proponujemy wielozadaniową strategię przedszkoleniową, aby wykorzystać bogate dane nieoznakowane wraz z zewnętrznymi danymi etykietowanymi do nauki reprezentacyjnej. Następnie projektujemy nową stratę kontrastywną, aby wykorzystać sygnały samoobserwujące w danych nieoznakowanych do klastrowania. Obszerne eksperymenty na trzech wskaźnikach odniesienia do rozpoznawania intencji pokazują wysoką skuteczność proponowanej metody, która znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody zarówno w scenariuszach bez nadzoru, jak i pół-nadzorowanych. Kod źródłowy będzie dostępny pod adresem \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'no': 'Ny oppdagingsmål er å opna noverande kategoriar frå brukarstaler for å utvida settet av støtta hendingsklassar. Det er ein kritisk oppgåve for utviklinga og utvidinga av tenester i eit praktisk dialogsystem. Tiltross viktigheten, er dette problemet under utforsk i literaturen. Dette eksisterande tilnærmingar er vanlegvis på ein stor mengd merkelige uttrykk og bruk pseudomerkelige metodar for å lære og klassera representasjonar, som er merkelapp intensiv, ikkje-effektiv og ikkje nokre. I denne papiret gjev vi nye løsningar til to viktige forskningsspørsmål for nye oppdaging: (1) korleis å lære semantiske uttrykk- representasjonar og (2) korleis å bedre uttrykk av cluster. I særskilt tilbyr vi først ein fleire oppgåver før opplæring strategi for å levera rike ubeabelte data saman med eksterne merkelige data for opplæring av representasjonar. Så designerer vi ein ny kontrasttap for å ekspluatera sjølvovervakingssignalar i uklasserte data for clustering. Eksempel på tre målsettingar for gjenkjenning demonstrerer høy effektivitet av vårt foreslått metode, som utfører tilstanden til kunsten med ein stor margin i både ulike og semioversikte scenarior. Kjeldekode vil vera tilgjengeleg ved « url » https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'ro': 'Noua descoperire a intențiilor își propune să descopere categorii noi de intenții de la declarațiile utilizatorilor pentru a extinde setul de clase de intenții acceptate. Este o sarcină esențială pentru dezvoltarea și extinderea serviciilor unui sistem practic de dialog. În ciuda importanței sale, această problemă rămâne subexplorată în literatură. Abordările existente se bazează, de obicei, pe o cantitate mare de afirmații etichetate și utilizează metode de pseudo-etichetare pentru învățarea reprezentării și clusterizarea, care sunt intensive de etichetare, ineficiente și inexacte. În această lucrare, oferim soluții noi la două întrebări importante de cercetare pentru descoperirea noilor intenții: (1) cum să învățăm reprezentările semantice ale pronunțării și (2) cum să îmbunătățim pronunțările grupurilor. În special, propunem mai întâi o strategie de pre-formare multi-sarcini pentru a valorifica date bogate fără etichete, împreună cu date externe etichetate pentru învățarea reprezentării. Apoi, proiectăm o nouă pierdere contrastivă pentru a exploata semnalele de auto-supraveghere din datele neetichetate pentru clustering. Experimentele extinse pe trei criterii de recunoaștere a intențiilor demonstrează eficacitatea ridicată a metodei propuse, care depășește cu o marjă mare metodele de ultimă generație atât în scenarii nesupravegheate, cât și în cele semi-supravegheate. Codul sursă va fi disponibil la \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'si': 'අළුත් අදහසක් හොයාගන්න අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයේ කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකය සඳහා සහය විස ඒක ප්\u200dරායෝක්ෂික සංවාද පද්ධතියේ විස්තර සහ සේවා විස්තර කරන්න විශේෂ වැඩක්. එයාගේ වැදගත් වුනත්, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ. ඉතින් ඉතින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සාමාන්\u200dය විශාල ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ලේබල් කිරීමේ විශාල ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ප්\u200dර මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකට අළුත් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා: (1) කොහොමද සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන් ඊට පස්සේ, අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක නිර්මාණය කරනවා ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරධාන සංඥාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ස්වා විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණ තුනක් තියෙන අදහස් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජන විධානයේ හොඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා, ඒකෙන් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝ මුළු කෝඩ \\url{ දී ප්\u200dරවේශය වෙන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN .', 'sr': 'Nova namera otkrivanja je cilj otkrivanja novih namera kategorija korisnika da proširi setu podržanih klasa namjera. To je kritičan zadatak za razvoj i proširenje usluga praktičnog dijaloga. Uprkos njenoj važnosti, ovaj problem ostaje pod istragom u literaturi. Postojeći pristupi se obično oslanjaju na veliku količinu označenih reči i upotrebljavaju metode pseudooznačavanja za učenje i skupljanje predstavljanja, koje su intenzivne etikete, neefektivne i nepravedno. U ovom papiru pružamo nove rešenja dva važna istraživačka pitanja za novo otkrivanje namera: 1) kako naučiti predstavljanja semantičkog govora i (2) kako bolje izraze skustera. Posebno, prvo predlažemo strategiju za predobuku višestrukih zadataka kako bi omogućili bogate neobičane podatke zajedno sa vanjskim označenim podacima za učenje predstavljanja. Onda dizajniramo novi kontrastivni gubitak da iskoristimo samopouzdane signale u neizbiljnim podacima za skustering. Eksperimenti na tri nivoa priznanja namjere pokazuju visoke efikasnosti našeg predloženog metoda, koji iznosi državne metode umjetnosti velikom marginom i u neodređenim i polu nadzornim scenarijama. Източни код ће бити доступен у \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada cusub waxaa loola jeedaa in uu soo muujiyo kooxo ka mid ah hadallada isticmaalayaasha si uu u kordhiyo koorasyada taageerada ah. Waa shaqo muhiim ah oo u horumarinta iyo koritaanka adeega nidaamka dialogka ee caadiga ah. Inta kastoo ay muhiim tahay, dhibaatadan waxay ku jirtaa mid la baaraandegay qoraalka. Dhaqdhaqaaqyada joogtada ah waxay inta badan ku xiran yihiin hadal badan oo la xiriiray, waxayna shaqeeyaan qaabab lagu qorayo waxbarashada iyo barashada, kuwaas oo ah mid aad u xiisaysan, oo aan suurtogal ahayn. In this paper, we provide new solutions to two important research questions for new intent discovery: (1) how to learn semantic utterance representations and (2) how to better cluster utterances.  Si gaar ah, waxaan marka ugu horraynaa qorshaha waxbarasho-horaadka ah u soo bandhignaynaa taajir ah oo aan la labeyn karin, waxaana la wadannaa macluumaad dibadda ah oo loo qoray waxbarashada la barto. Markaas waxaynu bilownaa khasaaro cusub oo ka gees ah si aan ugu isticmaalno calaamadaha isilaaliya oo aan la aqoon in la soo saaro. Imtixaan dheer oo ku qoran saddex meelood oo isku mid ah oo aqoonsashada ayaa muujiya awoodkeenna aad u dheer, kaas oo soo saara qaababka farshaxanta ah oo aad u weyn oo ku qoran labadooda aragtida oo aan la ilaalinayn iyo halka la ilaaliyo. Qorada asalka waxaa laga heli karaa \\url{0} https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN /', 'sv': 'Ny intentionsupptäckt syftar till att avslöja nya intentionskategorier från användaruttalanden för att utöka uppsättningen av intentionsklasser som stöds. Det är en viktig uppgift för utvecklingen och tjänsteutvidgningen av ett praktiskt dialogsystem. Trots dess betydelse är detta problem fortfarande underutforskat i litteraturen. Befintliga tillvägagångssätt förlitar sig vanligtvis på en stor mängd märkta yttranden och använder pseudomärkningsmetoder för representationsinlärning och klustring, vilka är etikettintensiva, ineffektiva och felaktiga. I denna uppsats ger vi nya lösningar på två viktiga forskningsfrågor för ny intention upptäckt: (1) hur man lär sig semantiska yttringsrepresentationer och (2) hur man bättre kluster yttringar. Särskilt föreslår vi först en strategi för fleruppgiftsutbildning för att dra nytta av rika omärkta data tillsammans med externa märkta data för representationslärande. Sedan utformar vi en ny kontrastiv förlust för att utnyttja självövervakningssignaler i omärkta data för klustring. Omfattande experiment på tre referensvärden för intention recognition visar den höga effektiviteten hos vår föreslagna metod, som med stor marginal överträffar state-of-the-art metoder både i oövervakade och halvövervakade scenarier. Källkoden kommer att finnas tillgänglig på \\ url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'ta': 'புதிய கண்டுபிடிப்பு புதிய புதிய விருப்பங்களை பயன்படுத்துபவரின் வார்த்தைகளிலிருந்து வகுப்புகளை வெளியிடுவதற்க இது ஒரு செயல்பாடு உரையாடல் முறைமையின் உருவாக்கத்திற்கும் சேவை விரிவாக்கத்திற்கும் முக்கியமா அது முக்கியமாக இருந்தாலும், இந்த பிரச்சினையின் இலக்கத்தில் தேடிக்கொண்டிருக்கிறது. தற்போதைய நெறுங்குகள் வழக்கமாக குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட சொல்லுகளின் மீது சார்ந்து இருக்கிறது மற்றும் குறிப்பிடும் கற்றல் மற்றும் மூடுதல் முறைகளை பிரதிநித இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புதிய தீர்வுகளை புதிய கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு இரண்டு முக்கியமான ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்விகளுக்கு புதிய தீர்வு குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் முதலில் பல பணி முன் பயிற்சி திட்டத்திற்கு செலவு செய்யும் பணக்கு அறியாத தகவல்களை வழங்குவதற்கு மேலும் வெளி க பின்னர், நாம் ஒரு புதிய எதிர்பார்வையான இழப்பை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் அடையாளமில்லாத தகவலில் கண்காணிப்பு குறிப்புகளை பயன் மூன்று தொடர்பு அடையாளங்கள் மீது விரிவான சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது எங்கள் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறையில் அதிக விளைவுகளை காட்டுகிறது, அது பெரிய காப்பாற்றப் மூல குறியீடு \\url\\ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN {0}', 'ur': 'نیا مطلب اچانک کا مطلب ہے کہ کارساز کلاس سے نو مطلب کائٹیوں کو اچانک کرے تاکہ مدد کی مطلب کلاس کا سٹ پھیلائے۔ یہ ایک قابل گفتگو سیسٹم کی توسعہ اور خدمت کی گھیرنے کے لئے ایک ضروری کام ہے۔ اس کی اہم بات کے بغیر، یہ مشکل ادبیات میں زیادہ تحقیق ہے۔ Existing approaches typically rely on a large amount of labeled words and use pseudo-labeling methods for representation learning and clustering, which are label-intensive, inefficient, and inaccurate. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے دو اہم تحقیق سوال کے لئے نو حل دیے ہیں: 1) کس طرح سیمنٹی بات کی تعلیم سکھائی کریں اور (2) کس طرح بہتر کلسٹر کی تعلیم کریں۔ مخصوصاً ہم پہلے ایک multi-task pre-training strategy propose to leverage rich non-labeled data along with external labeled data for representation learning. پھر ہم ایک نئی مخالف خسارہ طراحی کرتے ہیں کہ اپنے اوپر نظارت کی سیگنالیں استعمال کرنے کے لئے کلسٹر کے لئے غیرقابل دکھائے جاتے ہیں. تین مطابق معلوم کرنے والی بنچمبارک پر اضافہ کی تجربات ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کی بہت اثبات دکھاتی ہیں، جو ایک بڑی مقدار کے ذریعہ بغیر محفوظ اور نیم نظارت کی سناریوں میں بہت اثبات کرتی ہے. سراسر کوڈ \\url{پر موجود ہوگا https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'mk': 'Новото откритие на намерите има за цел откритие на категории на нови намери од изразите на корисникот за проширување на наборот на поддржани класи на намери. It is a critical task for the development and service expansion of a practical dialogue system.  Despite its importance, this problem remains under-explored in the literature.  Existing approaches typically rely on a large amount of labeled utterances and employ pseudo-labeling methods for representation learning and clustering, which are label-intensive, inefficient, and inaccurate.  Во овој весник обезбедуваме нови решенија на два важни истражувачки прашања за ново откритие на намерите: (1) како да се научи семантична репрезентација на изразите и (2) како да се подобрат репрезентациите на групирање. Particularly, we first propose a multi-task pre-training strategy to leverage rich unlabeled data along with external labeled data for representation learning.  Then, we design a new contrastive loss to exploit self-supervisory signals in unlabeled data for clustering.  Експериментите на три референтни значки за признавање на намерите ја покажуваат високата ефикасност на нашиот предложен метод, кој ги надминува најсовремените методи со голема маргина во ненадгледуваните и полунадгледуваните сценарија. The source code will be available at \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN - Да.', 'uz': "New intent discovery aims to uncover novel intent categories from user utterances to expand the set of supported intent classes.  Name Muhimlik bo'lsa, bu muammo haqida o'rganadi. Mavjud murakkablar odatda ko'p tuzilgan so'zlarga ishlatadi va o'rganish va murakkablarini tahrirlash usullarini ishlaydi. Bu oddiy narsalarning eng kattalashtiradi, kamid emas va emas. Bu hujjatda, biz yangi qanday qilish uchun ikkita muhim qidirish savollariga yangi xabar qilamiz:(1) semantik so'zlarni qanday o'rganish va (2) gapirarni qanday yaxshiroqni o'rganamiz. Shunday qilib, biz birinchi marta birinchi vazifa oldin o'rganishni tashqi o'rganish uchun ko'plab-vazifaning strategiyani o'rganish uchun o'zining natijadagi taʼlumotlar bilan yozib qo'yish. Keyin biz o'z o'zimni boshqarish uchun o'zimni boshqarish uchun yangi boshqaruv tap yaratumiz. Uch qanday tasdiqlarni tasdiqlash uchun kengaytirish imtiyozlarimiz, iloji qilingan usullamizning juda katta effektligini ko'rsatadi. Bu hamma saqlangan va semi taʼminlovchi holatda katta harfni bajaradi. Manba kodi \\url {da mavjud boʻladi https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN /.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện mục đích mới nhằm phát hiện mục đích mới từ người dùng để mở rộng nhóm các lớp mục đích được hỗ trợ. Đây là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng cho việc phát triển và phát triển một hệ thống đối thoại thực tế. Mặc dù tầm quan trọng của nó, vấn đề này vẫn chưa được nghiên cứu. Các phương pháp tồn tại thường dựa trên một lượng lớn những phát biểu được dán nhãn và sử dụng các phương pháp chế tạo hình giả để học phân tích và phân loại, mà là liều lĩnh, hiệu quả và không chính xác. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra những giải pháp mới cho hai vấn đề nghiên cứu quan trọng để khám phá ý định mới: Đặc biệt, chúng tôi đề xuất một chiến lược xếp hình nhiều nhiệm vụ để thúc đẩy những dữ liệu không tải đầy tội lỗi cùng với các dữ liệu nhãn bên ngoài để học đại diện. Sau đó, chúng tôi thiết kế một mất mát tương đối mới để khai thác tín hiệu tự giám sát trong dữ liệu không tải để đóng gói. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ với ba tiêu chuẩn xác nhận nhau chứng minh sự hiệu quả cao của phương pháp được đề xuất, nó vượt trội các phương pháp hiện đại, với một khoảng cách lớn trong các viễn cảnh không giám sát và bán giám sát. Mã nguồn sẽ được truy cập vào https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN .', 'bg': 'Откриването на нови намерения цели да разкрие нови категории намерения от потребителски изказвания, за да разшири набора от поддържани класове намерения. Това е критична задача за развитието и разширяването на услугите на практическа диалогова система. Въпреки важността си, този проблем остава недостатъчно проучен в литературата. Съществуващите подходи обикновено разчитат на голямо количество етикетирани изказвания и използват псевдо-етикетиращи методи за изучаване на представяне и клъстериране, които са интензивни, неефективни и неточни. В тази статия предлагаме нови решения на два важни изследователски въпроса за откриване на нови намерения: (1) как да се научат семантични представяния на изказванията и (2) как да се групират по-добре изказванията. По-конкретно, първо предлагаме стратегия за многозадачи преди обучение, за да се възползваме от богати неетикетирани данни заедно с външни етикетирани данни за обучение на представителство. След това проектираме нова контрастна загуба за използване на сигнали за самонадзор в немаркирани данни за клъстериране. Обширни експерименти върху три показатели за разпознаване на намерения демонстрират високата ефективност на нашия предложен метод, който превъзхожда най-съвременните методи с голям марж както в ненадвидени, така и в полунадзорни сценарии. Изходният код ще бъде достъпен на \\ url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'da': 'Ny hensigtsopdagelse har til formål at afdække nye hensigtskategorier fra brugerudtalelser for at udvide sættet af understøttede hensigtsklasser. Det er en afgørende opgave for udviklingen og serviceudvidelsen af et praktisk dialogsystem. På trods af dets betydning er dette problem fortsat underudforsket i litteraturen. Eksisterende tilgange er typisk afhængige af en stor mængde mærkede udtalelser og anvender pseudo-mærkningsmetoder til repræsentationslæring og klyngning, som er etiketintensive, ineffektive og unøjagtige. I denne artikel giver vi nye løsninger på to vigtige forskningsspørgsmål til ny intention opdagelse: (1) hvordan man lærer semantiske ytringsrepræsentationer og (2) hvordan man bedre klynger ytringer. Især foreslår vi først en multi-task pre-training strategi for at udnytte rige mærkede data sammen med eksterne mærkede data til repræsentationslæring. Derefter designer vi et nyt kontrasttab for at udnytte selvtilsynende signaler i ikke-mærkede data til klyngning. Omfattende eksperimenter på tre intent recognition benchmarks viser den høje effektivitet af vores foreslåede metode, som med stor margin overgår state-of-the-art metoder i både ubevågede og halvovervågede scenarier. Kildekoden vil være tilgængelig på \\ url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'nl': "Nieuwe intent discovery beoogt nieuwe intent categorieën uit gebruikersuitingen te ontdekken om de set ondersteunde intent klassen uit te breiden. Het is een cruciale taak voor de ontwikkeling en uitbreiding van een praktisch dialoogsysteem. Ondanks zijn belang blijft dit probleem onvoldoende onderzocht in de literatuur. Bestaande benaderingen berusten meestal op een grote hoeveelheid gelabelde uitingen en maken gebruik van pseudo-labeling methoden voor representatie learning en clustering, die labelintensief, inefficiënt en onnauwkeurig zijn. In dit artikel bieden we nieuwe oplossingen voor twee belangrijke onderzoeksvragen voor nieuwe intent discovery: (1) hoe leer je semantische expressie representaties en (2) hoe kun je uitingen beter clusteren. In het bijzonder stellen we eerst een multi-task pre-training strategie voor om rijke ongelabelde gegevens samen met externe gelabelde gegevens te gebruiken voor representatie learning. Vervolgens ontwerpen we een nieuw contrastief verlies om zelftoezichthoudende signalen in niet-gelabelde gegevens te benutten voor clustering. Uitgebreide experimenten met drie benchmarks voor intentieherkenning tonen de hoge effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde methode aan, die state-of-the-art methoden met een grote marge overtreft in zowel onbeheerde als semi-begeleide scenario's. De broncode is beschikbaar op \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.", 'de': 'Neue Intent Discovery zielt darauf ab, neue Intent-Kategorien aus Benutzeräußerungen aufzudecken, um den Satz unterstützter Intent-Klassen zu erweitern. Es ist eine kritische Aufgabe für die Entwicklung und Serviceerweiterung eines praxisnahen Dialogsystems. Trotz seiner Bedeutung bleibt dieses Problem in der Literatur untererforscht. Bestehende Ansätze stützen sich typischerweise auf eine große Menge beschrifteter Äußerungen und verwenden Pseudo-Labeling-Methoden für Repräsentationslernen und Clustering, die labelintensiv, ineffizient und ungenau sind. In diesem Beitrag bieten wir neue Lösungen für zwei wichtige Forschungsfragen für neue Intent Discovery: (1) wie man semantische Äußerungsrepräsentationen lernt und (2) wie man Äußerungen besser clustert. Insbesondere schlagen wir zunächst eine Multi-Task-Pre-Training-Strategie vor, um umfangreiche, nicht beschriftete Daten zusammen mit externen beschrifteten Daten für das Repräsentationslernen zu nutzen. Anschließend entwerfen wir einen neuen Kontrastverlust, um selbstüberwachende Signale in nicht beschrifteten Daten für Clustering zu nutzen. Umfangreiche Experimente an drei Intent Recognition Benchmarks belegen die hohe Effektivität unserer vorgeschlagenen Methode, die sowohl in unbeaufsichtigten als auch semi-überwachten Szenarien moderne Methoden deutlich übertrifft. Der Quellcode wird unter \\url{verfügbar sein https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'hr': 'Nova namjera otkrivanja cilja je otkriti nove kategorije namjere iz govora korisnika kako bi se proširila seta podržane klase namjere. To je kritičan zadatak za proširenje razvoja i usluga praktičnog dijaloga. Unatoč njenoj važnosti, ovaj problem ostaje pod istragom u literaturi. Postojeći pristupi se obično oslanjaju na veliku količinu označenih riječi i koriste metode pseudooznačavanja za učenje i skupljanje predstavljanja, koje su intenzivne etikete, neefektivne i nepravedno. U ovom papiru pružamo nove rješenja dvije važne istraživačke pitanja za novo otkrivanje namjera: 1) kako naučiti predstavljanja semantičkog govora i (2) kako bolje izraze skustera. Posebno, prvo predlažemo strategiju za predobuku višezadataka kako bi se uključili bogati nezabelirani podaci zajedno s vanjskim označenim podacima za učenje predstavljanja. Onda ćemo dizajnirati novi kontrastni gubitak kako bi iskoristili samopouzdane signale u neopisivanim podacima za skupljanje. Prošireni eksperimenti na tri temelja priznanja namjere pokazuju visoku učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda, što iznosi metode države umjetnosti velikom marginom u neovisnim i polu nadzornim scenarijama. Izvorni kod će biti dostupan na \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'ko': '새로운 의도 발견은 지원되는 의도 클래스를 확장하기 위해 사용자의 언어에서 새로운 의도 클래스를 발견하는 데 목적을 둔다.이것은 실용 대화 시스템을 개발하고 확장하는 관건적인 임무다.비록 이 문제는 매우 중요하지만 문헌에서 이 문제에 대한 탐구는 여전히 부족하다.기존의 방법은 대량의 표기 언어에 의존하고 위조 표기 방법으로 표징 학습과 분류를 하는데 이런 방법은 표기가 밀집되고 효율이 낮으며 정확하지 않다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 의도를 발견하기 위해 두 가지 중요한 연구 문제에 새로운 해결 방안을 제공했다. (1) 의미 언어 표징을 어떻게 배우는가, (2) 대화어를 어떻게 더 잘 분류하는가.특히 우리는 먼저 다중 임무 예비 훈련 전략을 제기하여 풍부한 미표기 데이터와 외부 표기 데이터를 이용하여 표징 학습을 한다.그 다음에 우리는 새로운 대비 손실을 설계하여 표기되지 않은 데이터 중의 자기 감독 신호를 이용하여 분류했다.세 가지 의도 식별 기준에서 진행된 대량의 실험을 통해 우리가 제시한 방법은 매우 높은 유효성을 가지고 감독과 반감독이 없는 상황에서 최신 방법보다 훨씬 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.소스 코드는\\url에서 {https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN}.', 'id': 'Penemuan tujuan baru bermaksud untuk menemukan kategori tujuan baru dari ucapan pengguna untuk memperluas set kelas tujuan yang didukung. Ini adalah tugas kritis untuk pengembangan dan ekspansi layanan sistem dialog praktis. Meskipun pentingnya, masalah ini masih belum dikeksplorasi dalam literatur. Pendekatan yang ada biasanya bergantung pada jumlah besar ucapan yang ditabel dan menggunakan metode pseudo-labeling untuk mempresentasi belajar dan clustering, yang adalah label-intensiv, ineffektif, dan tidak tepat. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyediakan solusi baru untuk dua pertanyaan penelitian penting untuk penemuan tujuan baru: (1) bagaimana untuk belajar representation kata semantis dan (2) bagaimana untuk mengumpulkan ucapan yang lebih baik. Terutama, kami pertama-tama mengusulkan strategi multi-tugas pra-pelatihan untuk menggunakan data yang kaya tanpa tanda bersama dengan data yang ditandai luar untuk pelajaran representation. Kemudian, kami merancang kehilangan kontras baru untuk mengeksploitasi sinyal pengawasan diri dalam data yang tidak disebut untuk berkumpul. Eksperimen ekstensif pada tiga benchmark pengakuan tujuan menunjukkan efektivitas tinggi dari metode kami yang diusulkan, yang melebihi metode state-of-the-art dengan margin besar dalam skenario yang tidak diawasi dan semi-diawasi. Kode sumber akan tersedia di \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'sw': 'Lengo mpya la kugundua lengo la kugundua makundi makubwa ya riwaya kutoka kwenye hotuba za watumiaji ili kuongeza seti ya darasa lenye uungwaji mkono. Ni jukumu muhimu kwa maendeleo na upanuaji wa mfumo wa mazungumzo ya kihalisi. Pamoja na umuhimu wake, tatizo hili bado linaendelea kuchunguzwa katika fasihi. Matokeo yanayopo kawaida yanategemea kwa kiasi kikubwa cha maneno yanayoonyesha na kutumia mbinu za kuwakilisha elimu na kuhamasisha, ambazo ni kwa kiasi kikubwa, kisichoeleweka na usio sahihi. Katika gazeti hili, tunatoa suluhisho mpya kwa maswali mawili muhimu ya utafiti kwa ajili ya kutambua malengo mapya: (1) jinsi ya kujifunza uwakilishi wa maneno ya kigaidi na (2) jinsi ya kuendesha hotuba bora. Hasa, kwanza tunapendekeza mkakati wa mafunzo kabla ya kazi nyingi ili kutumia taarifa zenye utajiri isiyo tajwa pamoja na taarifa za nje kwa ajili ya kujifunza uwakilizaji. Kisha, tunaunda hasara mpya inayopingana ili kutumia ishara za kujitawala katika taarifa zisizoeleweka kwa kutangaza. Majaribio mengi kuhusu misingi matatu ya kutambua makusudi yanaonyesha ufanisi mkubwa wa njia yetu ya mapendekezo, ambayo inaonyesha mbinu za hali ya sanaa kwa njia kubwa katika mazingira yasiyoeleweka na yanayofuatiliwa na nusu. Kundi la chanzo litapatikana kwenye \\url https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN /.', 'tr': 'Täze maksady keşfedmek amasynda Ullançylar sözlerinden taýýarlaryň niýetlerini açmak üçin maksady. Bu praktik dijalog sisteminiň gelişmegi we häsiýetleşmegi üçin wajyp zady. Munuň wajyplygyna rağmen, bu mesele edebiýatyň aşagynda ýok. Existence yaklaşmalar genelde etiketli sözler üzerinde dayanır ve öğrenmek ve klasteri temsil etmek için pseudo-etiketleme yöntemlerini kullanarlar. Bu etiket intensiv, etkisiz ve yanlış şekilde değerlendirilmez. Bu kagyzda, biz täze maksady keşfetmek üçin iki möhüm araştyrma soragyna täze çözümler bererik: (1) semantik sözlerini nädip öwrenmeli we (2) cluster sözlerini nädip gowy öwrenmeli. Özellikde, biz ilkinji gezek birnäçe zady öňünden öňünden boýunça ýazylmayan maglumatlary taýýarlamak üçin birnäçe zady öňünden öňünden öňünden gelen strategiýany teklip edýäris. Sonra klastering üçin ýazylmaz maglumatlary ulanmak üçin täze kontrast ýitirmegi tasarlanýarys. Üç maksada tanamak çykyşlarynda örän uzakly deneyler biziň teklip eden yöntemimiziň ýokary etkinlik ukypyny görkezip bilýärler. Bu şekilde durum-sanat yöntemlerini hem garyplanmaýan, hem ýarym-gözleýän senaryoňda örän uly gabdalyk bilen çykarýar. %s adresi bar https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'fa': 'کشف هدف جدید هدف می\u200cگیرد که کلاس\u200cهای هدف\u200cهای نوی را از سخن\u200cهای کاربر باز کند تا مجموعه کلاس\u200cهای هدف\u200cهای پشتیبانی را گسترش دهد. این یک وظیفه مهمی برای توسعه و گسترش خدمت یک سیستم گفتگوی عملی است. با وجود مهمتش، این مشکل در ادبیات تحقیق می\u200cکند. نزدیک\u200cهای موجود معمولاً بر تعداد زیادی از زبان\u200cهای برچسب\u200cشده استفاده می\u200cکنند و از روش\u200cهای برچسب\u200cهای pseudo-labeling برای نمایش یادگیری و گروه\u200cسازی استفاده می\u200cکنند، که نشانه\u200cهای زیادی، بی\u200cتاثیر و غیر دقیق هستند. در این کاغذ، ما برای دو سوال تحقیقات مهم برای کشف هدف جدید راه حل جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: (۱) چگونه یاد بگیریم نمایش\u200cدهندگان سخنرانی semantic و (۲) چگونه بهتر سخنرانی کلاستر باشیم. مخصوصا، ما اولین بار یک استراتژی پیش آموزش چندین کار را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا داده\u200cهای ثروتمندی را با داده\u200cهای خارجی که برای یادگیری نمایش\u200cگذاری برنامه\u200cگذاری شده\u200cاند تحت تاثیر قرار دهیم. سپس، ما یک خسارت جدید متفاوتی را طراحی می کنیم تا سیگنال های خود را در اطلاعات غیرقابل نوشته برای کلاستر استفاده کنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای بر سه مقدار شناسایی هدف نشان می\u200cدهد که موثرت بالا از روش پیشنهاد ما، که روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنر را با یک مقدار بزرگ در هر دو سناریو غیرقابل تحقیق و نیمه تحقیق می\u200cکند. کد منبع در » url « موجود خواهد بود https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN .', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i ri i qëllimeve synon të zbulojë kategori të reja të qëllimeve nga shprehjet e përdoruesve për të zgjeruar grupin e klasave të mbështetura të qëllimeve. Është një detyrë kritike për zhvillimin dhe zgjerimin e shërbimeve të një sistemi praktik dialogu. Megjithë rëndësinë e saj, ky problem mbetet i pakëputur në letërsi. Përqasjet ekzistuese zakonisht mbështeten në një sasi të madhe shprehjesh të etiketuara dhe përdorin metoda pseudo-etiketuese për përfaqësimin e mësimit dhe grupimit, të cilat janë intensive në etiketë, jo efektive dhe jo të sakta. Në këtë letër, ne ofrojmë zgjidhje të reja për dy pyetje të rëndësishme kërkimi për zbulimin e qëllimeve të reja: (1) si të mësojmë përfaqësime të shprehjeve semantike dhe (2) si të mbledhim më mirë shprehjet. Veçanërisht, ne së pari propozojmë një strategji parastërvitjeje me shumë detyra për të përdorur të dhëna të pasura pa etiketë së bashku me të dhënat e jashtme të etiketuara për përfaqësimin e mësimit. Pastaj, ne dizajnojmë një humbje të re kontraste për të shfrytëzuar sinjalet vetë-mbikqyrëse në të dhëna pa etiketë për grupimin. Extensive experiments on three intent recognition benchmarks demonstrate the high effectiveness of our proposed method, which outperforms state-of-the-art methods by a large margin in both unsupervised and semi-supervised scenarios.  Kodi burimi do të jetë në dispozicion në \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'af': "Nuwe doel ontdekking doel om nuwe doel kategories van gebruiker uitspraak te ontdek om die stel van ondersteunde doel klasse te uitbrei. Dit is 'n kritiese taak vir die ontwikkeling en diens uitbreiding van 'n praktiese dialoog stelsel. Onthou sy belangrikheid, bly hierdie probleem onder ondersoek in die literature. Bestaande toegang tipies vertrou op 'n groot hoeveelheid etiketeerde uitdrukkings en gebruik pseudo- etiketeermetodes vir voorstelling leer en klastering, wat is etiket- intensief, oneffektief en onregverdig. In hierdie papier, ons verskaf nuwe oplossing vir twee belangrike ondersoek vrae vir nuwe doel ontdekking: (1) hoe om semantiese uitspraak voorstellings te leer en (2) hoe om beter klaster uitspraak te leer. Spesiaal, ons voorstel eerste 'n multi-taak voor-onderwerp strategie om ryk ongeabelde data te verwyder saam met eksterne etiketeerde data vir voorwerp-onderwerp te leer. Toe ontwerp ons 'n nuwe kontrastiewe verlies om self-supervisor-seinales in ongeabelde data vir clustering te gebruik. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op drie doel herken benchmarke bevestig die hoë effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde metode, wat uitvoer staat-van-die-kunstensmetodes deur 'n groot grens in beide ongeonderwerp en semi-onderwerp scenarioe. Die bronkode sal beskikbaar wees by \\url { https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.", 'am': "አዲስ ማግኘት አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር የአስቸጋሪው ማነሻ ስርዓት እና ለማገልገል ማሰናከል የሚያስቸገር ስራ ነው፡፡ ምንም አዋቂ ቢሆንም ይህ መከራ በዝርዝርት ውስጥ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች በተጨማሪው በአካባቢው በጽሑፍ ቃላት ላይ ይታመናሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አዲስ ማስታወቂያ ለመፍጠር ለሁለት አስፈላጊ ጥያቄዎችን አዲስ መፍትሄቶችን እና (2) ቃላትን እንዴት ለመሻል እናስተማራለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ አስቀድመን የብዙ ስራ ተማሪ ቀድሞ ስርዓት ባለ ሀብታም ያልታወቀ ዳታዎችን ለመስጠት እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ አዲስ ተቃዋሚ ጉዳይ የራሳዊ ስልክቶችን ለመከላከል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሦስት ማስታወቂያው ላይ የረፊ ፈተናዎች የፕሮግራሙን የ-የ-የ-የ-art ሥርዓት አካባቢ እና በተጠበቀው እና በsemi-ታይተዋል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN Organisation", 'hy': 'Նոր մտադրությունների հայտնաբերումը նպատակն է բացահայտել նոր մտադրությունների կատեգորիաները օգտագործողի արտահայտություններից, որպեսզի ընդլայնվի աջակցված մտադրությունների դասերի շարքը: Սա կարևոր խնդիր է, որպեսզի զարգացվի և ծառայությունը ընդլայնվի մի գործնական երկխոսային համակարգ: Չնայած դրա կարևորությանը, այս խնդիրը դեռևս բացահայտվում է գրականության մեջ: Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները սովորաբար հիմնված են մի մեծ քանակությամբ պիտակուցված արտահայտությունների վրա և օգտագործում են կեղծ պիտակուցման մեթոդներ ներկայացնելու ուսումնասիրության և խմբավորության համար, որոնք պիտակուցը ինտենսիվ են, անարդյունավետ և անճշ Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նոր լուծումներ ենք տրամադրում երկու կարևոր հետազոտության հարցերին նոր մտադրությունների հայտնաբերման համար: (1) ինչպես սովորել սեմանտիկ արտահայտություններ և (2) ինչպես ավելի լավ խմբավորել արտահայտություններ: Հատկապես, մենք առաջին անգամ առաջարկում ենք բազմաթիվ խնդիրների նախապատրաստ ռազմավարման ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի օգտագործենք հարուստ անմակարդակ տվյալներ, ինչպես նաև արտաքին նշանակված տվյալներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են Այնուհետև մենք ստեղծում ենք նոր հակադրական կորուստ, որպեսզի օգտագործենք ինքնավերահսկողական ազդանշաններ առանց նշանների տվյալներում խմբագրելու համար: Երեք նպատակի ճանաչման հարաբերականների ընդլայնված փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկված մեթոդի բարձր արդյունավետությունը, որը գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր մեթոդները մեծ տարբերակով ոչ վերահսկված, ոչ էլ կիսավերահսկված սցենարներում: Առաջին կոդը հասանելի է \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'bn': 'নতুন উদ্দেশ্য আবিষ্কারের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে ব্যবহারকারীর বক্তব্য থেকে উল্লেখযোগ্য ক্ষেত্রে সমর্থিত ক্লাসের সেট বিস এটা একটি ব্যাক্তিগত ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের উন্নয়ন এবং সেবা বিস্তৃতির জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। তার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সত্ত্বেও, এই সমস্যা সাহিত্যে বিস্তারিত অবস্থায় রয়েছে। বিদ্যমান উপায় সাধারণত বিশাল বাক্যের উপর নির্ভর করে এবং শিক্ষা এবং ক্লাস্টিং এর প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য প্রাপ্ত প্র In this paper, we provide new solutions to two important research questions for new intent discovery: (1) how to learn semantic utterance representations and (2) how to better cluster utterances.  বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথমে একটি বহুক্ষেত্র প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্ব কৌশল প্রস্তাব করি যাতে প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য বাইরের ল তারপর আমরা একটি নতুন বিরোধী ক্ষতির ডিজাইন করি আত্মপর্যবেক্ষক সিগন্যাল ব্যবহার করার জন্য। প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির বিশাল পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত বেনম্যার্কের উচ্চ কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে, যা দুটোই সংরক্ষিত এবং সেমি পর্যবেক্ষিত দৃশ্যের মধ্যে বি সোর্স কোড \\url\\ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN ”।', 'bs': 'Nova namjera otkrivanja cilja je otkriti nove kategorije namjere iz govora korisnika da proširi set podržanih klasa namjera. To je kritičan zadatak za proširenje razvoja i usluga praktičnog dijaloga. Unatoč njenoj važnosti, ovaj problem ostaje pod istragom u literaturi. Postojeći pristupi se obično oslanjaju na veliku količinu označenih govora i koriste metode pseudooznačavanja za učenje i skupljanje predstavljanja, koje su intenzivne etikete, neefektivne i nepravedno. U ovom papiru pružamo nove rješenja dva važna istraživačka pitanja za nove namjere otkrivanja: (1) kako naučiti predstavljanja semantičkog govora i (2) kako bolje izraze skustera. Posebno, prvo predlažemo strategiju za predobuku višezadataka kako bi omogućili bogate nepobeležene podatke zajedno s vanjskim podacima označenim za učenje predstavljanja. Onda dizajniramo novi kontrastni gubitak kako bi iskoristili samopouzdane signale u neizbiljnim podacima za skupljanje. Prošireni eksperimenti na tri temelja priznanja namjere pokazuju visokoj učinkovitosti našeg predloženog metoda, koji nadmaže metode države umjetnosti velikom marginom i u neodređenim i polu nadzornim scenarijama. Izvorni kod će biti dostupan na \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'az': 'Yeni niyyət keşif istifadəçilərin sözlərindən yeni niyyət kategoriyalarını açmaq məqsədilə dəstəklənmiş niyyətlər dəstəsini genişləşdirmək istəyir. Bu, praktik dijalog sisteminin gelişməsi və servis genişlənməsi üçün kritik bir işdir. Onun məqsədili olmasına rağmen, bu problemi dəlilikdə aşağı keşif edilir. Existing approach typically rely on a large amount of labeled words and use pseudo-labeling methods for representation learning and clustering, which are label-intensive, inefficient and inaccurate. Bu kağızda, yeni niyyət keşif üçün iki möhüm araştırma sualına yeni çətinliklər təyin edirik: (1) semantik sözlər göstərişlərini öyrənmək və (2) daha yaxşı cluster sözlərini öyrənmək. Özellikle, biz ilk dəfə müəyyən olunması üçün çoxlu iş öyrənmək stratejisini təklif edirik ki, baxımınca müəyyən edilməmiş məlumatları ilə birlikdə daxil etiketli məlumatları təklif edək. Sonra, özünüzü gözləmə signalarını clustering məlumatlarında istifadə etmək üçün yeni müxtəlif bir zəiflik tasarladıq. Üç niyyətli tanıma müəyyən etdiyimiz tədbir metodlarının yüksək etkinliğini göstərir. Bu, həmçin in tədbir edilməmiş, həmçinin yarı-gözləməmiş senaryolarında böyük bir margin ilə mövcuddur. Kaynak kodu \\url{ vasitəsində faydalanacaq https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'cs': 'Cílem nového zjištění záměrů je odhalit nové kategorie záměrů z uživatelských projevů a rozšířit sadu podporovaných tříd záměrů. Je to klíčový úkol pro vývoj a rozšíření služeb praktického dialogového systému. I přes svůj význam tento problém zůstává v literatuře nedostatečně prozkoumaný. Stávající přístupy obvykle spoléhají na velké množství označených výroků a využívají pseudo-značkovací metody pro učení se reprezentací a shlukování, které jsou náročné na štítky, neefektivní a nepřesné. V tomto článku poskytujeme nová řešení dvou důležitých výzkumných otázek pro objevování nových záměrů: (1) jak se naučit sémantické reprezentace výroku a (2) jak lépe shlukovat výroky. Zejména navrhujeme víceúlohovou strategii předškolení, která využívá bohatá data bez značky spolu s externími označenými daty pro učení reprezentace. Následně navrhneme novou kontrastní ztrátu pro využití signálů samovládání v neštítkovaných datech pro shlukování. Rozsáhlé experimenty na třech benchmarkech pro rozpoznávání záměrů ukazují vysokou efektivitu naší navrhované metody, která překonává nejmodernější metody jak v bez dohledu, tak v polovičním dohledu. Zdrojový kód bude k dispozici na \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'et': 'Uue kavatsuste avastamise eesmärk on avastada kasutaja väljenditest uued kavatsuste kategooriad, et laiendada toetatud kavatsusklasside hulka. See on kriitiline ülesanne praktilise dialoogisüsteemi arendamiseks ja teenuste laiendamiseks. Vaatamata oma tähtsusele on see probleem kirjanduses endiselt vähe uuritud. Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid põhinevad tavaliselt suurel hulgal märgistatud väljenditel ning kasutavad pseudomärgistusmeetodeid esindamise õppimiseks ja klastrite koondamiseks, mis on märgistusmahukad, ebatõhusad ja ebatäpsed. Käesolevas töös pakume uusi lahendusi kahele olulisele uurimisküsimusele uute kavatsuste avastamiseks: (1) kuidas õppida semantilisi väljendeid ja (2) kuidas paremini klastritada väljendeid. Eelkõige pakume esmalt välja mitme ülesandega koolituseelse strateegia, et kasutada rikkalikke märgistamata andmeid koos väliste märgistatud andmetega esindusõppe jaoks. Seejärel kujundame uue kontrastse kaotuse, et kasutada klastrite jaoks märgistamata andmetes sisalduvaid isejärelevalvesignaale. Laiaulatuslikud katsed kolme kavatsuste tunnustamise võrdlusalusega näitavad meie kavandatud meetodi suurt tõhusust, mis ületab tipptasemel meetodeid nii järelevalveta kui ka pooljärelevalveta stsenaariumides. Lähtekood on kättesaadav aadressil \\ url{. https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'ca': "El descobriment de noves intencions mira a descobrir noves categories d'intencions a partir de les expressions d'usuari per ampliar el conjunt de classes d'intencions suportades. És una tasca crítica per al desenvolupament i l'expansió dels serveis d'un sistema de diàleg pràctic. Malgrat la seva importància, aquest problema segueix sota-explorat a la literatura. Els enfocaments existents normalment es basan en una gran quantitat de frases etiquetades i utilitzen mètodes pseudoetiquetats per a l'aprenentatge de representació i el agrupament, que són intensives en etiquetes, ineficients i inaccurats. In this paper, we provide new solutions to two important research questions for new intent discovery: (1) how to learn semantic utterance representations and (2) how to better cluster utterances.  En particular, primer proposem una estratègia de pré-capacitació multitasca per aprofitar les riques dades no etiquetades juntament amb les dades externes etiquetades per a l'aprenentatge de representació. Llavors dissenyem una nova pèrdua contrastiva per explotar senyals d'autosupervisió en dades no marcades per agrupar-se. Els extensos experiments en tres punts de referència de reconeixement d'intencions demostren l'alta eficacia del nostre mètode proposat, que supera els mètodes més avançats en gran marge tant en escenaris no supervisats com semisupervisats. El codi fontestarà disponible en \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.", 'fi': 'Uuden intent-etsinnän tavoitteena on löytää uusia intent-luokkia käyttäjien lauseista ja laajentaa tuettujen intent-luokkien joukkoa. Se on ratkaiseva tehtävä käytännön dialogijärjestelmän kehittämiselle ja palvelulaajentamiselle. Merkityksellisyydestään huolimatta tätä ongelmaa ei ole vielä tutkittu kirjallisuudessa. Nykyiset lähestymistavat perustuvat tyypillisesti suureen määrään merkittyjä lauseita ja käyttävät pseudo-merkintämenetelmiä representaation oppimiseen ja klusterointiin, jotka ovat etikettiintensiivisiä, tehottomia ja epätarkkoja. Tässä artikkelissa tarjoamme uusia ratkaisuja kahteen tärkeään tutkimuskysymykseen uusien aikomusten löytämiseksi: (1) semanttisten ilmaisuesitysten oppimiseen ja (2) lauseiden yhdistämiseen. Erityisesti ehdotamme ensin monitehtävää esikoulutusta koskevaa strategiaa, jolla hyödynnetään runsaasti merkitsemätöntä dataa sekä ulkoista merkittyä dataa edustusoppimiseen. Tämän jälkeen suunnittelemme uuden kontrastihäviön hyödyntämään omavalvontasignaaleja merkitsemättömässä datassa klusterointia varten. Laajat kokeilut kolmella intent recognition benchmarkilla osoittavat ehdotetun menetelmän korkean tehokkuuden, joka ylittää huipputason menetelmät suurella marginaalilla sekä valvomattomissa että puolivalvotuissa skenaarioissa. Lähdekoodi on saatavilla osoitteessa \\ url{. https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'sk': 'Namen novega iskanja namenov je odkriti nove kategorije namenov iz uporabniških izjav in razširiti nabor podprtih razredov namenov. To je ključna naloga za razvoj in širitev storitev praktičnega dialognega sistema. Kljub svojemu pomenu je ta problem še vedno premalo raziskan v literaturi. Obstoječi pristopi se običajno zanašajo na veliko število označenih izjav in uporabljajo psevdoznačevalne metode za učenje reprezentacije in združevanje v grozdih, ki so intenzivne, neučinkovite in netočne. V prispevku predstavljamo nove rešitve dveh pomembnih raziskovalnih vprašanj za odkrivanje novih namenov: (1) kako se naučiti semantičnih predstavitev izgovorov in (2) kako bolje združiti izgovore. Predvsem predlagamo večopravilno strategijo pred usposabljanjem, da bi izkoristili bogate neoznačene podatke skupaj z zunanjimi označenimi podatki za učenje reprezentacije. Nato oblikujemo novo kontrastno izgubo za izkoriščanje samonadzornih signalov v neoznačenih podatkih za grozdje. Obsežni eksperimenti na treh merilih za prepoznavanje namenov kažejo visoko učinkovitost naše predlagane metode, ki v veliki meri presega najsodobnejše metode tako v neobzorovanem kot v polnadzorovanem scenariju. Izvorna koda bo na voljo na \\ url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'he': 'גילוי כוונות חדשים מתכוון לחשוף קטגוריות כוונות חדשות מבטאות משתמשים כדי להרחיב את קבוצת שיעורי כוונות תומכות. זו משימה קריטית לפיתוח ולהרחיב שירות של מערכת דיאלוג מעשית. למרות חשיבותו, הבעיה הזאת נשארת תחת חקירה בספרות. גישות קיימות בדרך כלל תלויות בכמות גדולה של מבטות מסומנות ומשתמשות שיטות סיפו-סיפו-סיפור לימוד מייצגות ומקבוצות, שהן אינטנסיביות לתוויות, לא יעילות ולא מדויקות. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מספקים פתרונות חדשות לשני שאלות מחקר חשובות לגילוי כוונה חדשה: (1) איך ללמוד מייצגים מילים סמנטיים (semantic utterance representations) (2) איך לקבוע מילים טובים יותר. במיוחד, אנו קודם מציעים אסטרטגיה מלפני אימון במשימות רבות כדי להשתמש במידע עשיר ללא סימנים ואז, אנחנו מעצבים אובדן נוגדי חדש כדי לנצל אותות מעקב עצמי במידע ללא סימנים לקבוצה. ניסויים רחבים על שלושה נקודות זיהוי כוונות מראים את היעילות הגבוהה של השיטה המוצעת שלנו, אשר עולה על שיטות חדשות במיוחד על ידי שווה גדולה בתרחישים בלתי מושגים ולחצי מושגים. The source code will be available at \\url{ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN .', 'jv': 'Raylan Iki iku kelompok kanggo nggawe sistem sing dikarol karo akeh nyebuti nggawe sistem dialog pratike. Ingka mbok seneng nggawe, kesempatan iki dadi luwih-luwih neng akeh basa. buddy Nang paper iki, kita diwangiye perusahaan anyar kanggo sabanjuré iki sak cara sing luwih kanggo nggawe barang nggawe wih: ngomong: Amargi punika, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing perusahaan karo perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo ngilangno sistem sing beraksi kuwi mau. stretch Coverage https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN %.', 'bo': 'དམིགས་ཡུལ་གསར་བ་འདི་ལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་བརྗོད་རྗེས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཚིག དེ་ནི་ལག་ལེན་གྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་མ་ལག་གི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ཞིག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་དང་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་ལས་འགན་ཆ དེའི་གལ་ཆེན་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བ་རེད། Existing approaches typically rely on a large amount of labeled utterances and employ pseudo-labeling methods for representation learning and clustering, which are label-intensive, inefficient, and inaccurate. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཐབས་ཤེས་གསར་བ་དག་གལ་ཆེན་འཚོལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་འཇུག་གི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཇི་ལྟ Particularly, we first propose a multi-task pre-training strategy to leverage rich unlabeled data along with external labeled data for representation learning. དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྟོན་མེད་པའི་ནང་གི་ Extensive experiments on three intent recognition benchmarks demonstrate the high effectiveness of our proposed method, which outperforms state-of-the-art methods by a large margin in both unsupervised and semi-supervised scenarios. \\\\url{ནང་དུ་ཐོབ་ཁུངས་ཨང་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་ཡོད་པ https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN }.', 'ha': "Aiki na yanzu don ya yi amfani da ya sami nau'i masu cikin nau'i na yanzu-nau'i daga maganar mai amfani da shi dõmin ya faɗaɗa tsarin darafõfi masu ƙaranci. Babu wani aikin muhimmi wa buɗe da shirin ayuka na zauren zauren akwatin bayani na gaske. Babu muhimmin da yake, ma'abũcin wannan ma'abuta yana ƙara cikin littafin. Yinin da ake kai yana dõgara a kan abu mai girma na maganar da aka rubuta kuma ana yi amfani da shiryoyin cewa-labelin wa halartawa da aka karanta da clustring, da masu cikin littãfin da ke cikin tsari, kuma bã da kasa. Daga wannan takardan, Munã gaura masu shiryarwa biyu masu muhimu wa tambayi biyu na fassarar tafarki dõmin gannai yanzu: (1) yadda zã a iya fahimta misalin magana na semantiki da (2) yadda za su fi ƙara magana. Particularly, we first propose a multi-task pre-training strategy to leverage rich unlabeled data along with external labeled data for representation learning.  Sa'an nan kuma, za mu ƙayyade wata hasara mai iya motsi dõmin mu yi amfani da alama na kangara cikin data wanda ba'a sani ba. Akwai jarrabi masu ƙaranci a kan bangon gaskiyar uku sun nuna mafiya tsari na hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata, wanda ke cika metoden-state-the-art da matsayin babba a cikin duk da ba'a tsare shi ba da kuma aka tsare shi. Suna iya samar da kodi na source a /url https://github.com/zhang-yu-wei/MTP-CLNN >"}
{'en': 'Toward Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'ar': '{M} odeling {U.S.} السياسات على مستوى الولاية عن طريق استخلاص الفائزين والخاسرين من النصوص التشريعية', 'es': '{M} Modelado {EE. UU.} Políticas a nivel estatal mediante la extracción de ganadores y perdedores de los textos legislativos', 'fr': "{M} Modeling {États-Unis} Politiques au niveau de l'État en extrayant les gagnants et les perdants des textes législatifs", 'pt': '{Modelando {U.S.} Políticas Estaduais Extraindo Vencedores e Perdedores de Textos Legislativos', 'ja': '立法条文から勝者と敗者を抽出することによる州レベルのポリシーの{M}廃止{U.S.}', 'zh': '{M}odeling {U.S.} 取赢家、输家国家级政', 'hi': '{M}odeling {U.S.} विधायी ग्रंथों से विजेताओं और हारे हुए लोगों को निकालकर राज्य-स्तरीय नीतियां', 'ru': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Политика на уровне штатов путем извлечения победителей и проигравших из законодательных текстов', 'ga': '{M}Polasaithe ar Leibhéal an Stáit {S.A.} a mheas trí Bhuaiteoirí agus Cailliúnaithe a Bhaint as Téacsanna Reachtaíochta', 'ka': '{M} პოლიტიკური დონეზე პოლიტიკური გადატანა', 'el': 'Πολιτικές σε κρατικό επίπεδο με την εξαγωγή νικητών και ηττημένων από νομοθετικά κείμενα', 'hu': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Állami szintű politikák a győztesek és vesztesek kivonásával a jogszabályi szövegekből', 'it': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Politiche a livello statale estraendo vincitori e perdenti dai testi legislativi', 'lt': '{M}modernizavimas {JAV} Valstybių lygmens politika, kurią vykdo laimėtojai ir pralaimėtojai ištraukiami iš teisės aktų tekstų', 'kk': '{M} {U.S.} Күй- деңгейіндегі ережелерді бағдарламалық мәтіндерден жеңілдерді және жоғалушыларды тарқату арқылы', 'mk': 'Политики на државно ниво од извлекување на победниците и губитниците од легислативните тексти', 'ms': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Polisi Aras-Negeri oleh Ekstrak Pemenang dan Pengkalah dari Teks Legislatif', 'ml': '{M} നിയമമായ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിജയികളെയും പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d {U.S.} സ്റ്റേറ്റ് നിലനില പോലീസുകള്\u200d', 'mt': '{M}odellar {U.S.} Politiki fil-livell tal-Istat permezz tal-Estrazzjoni tar-Rebbieħa u t-Telf mit-Testi Leġiżlattivi', 'mn': '{M} {U.S.} Улс төвшин улс төвшин улс төрийг хуулийн үеэс ялагчид болон алдагчид', 'no': '{M} odeller {U.S.} Statusnivåpolitikk ved å pakka ut vinner og taparar frå legislativ tekst', 'pl': '{M}modelowanie {U.S.} Polityka stanowa poprzez wyciąganie zwycięzców i przegranych z tekstów legislacyjnych', 'ro': '{M}modeling {U.S.} Politici la nivel de stat prin extragerea câștigătorilor și pierzătorilor din textele legislative', 'sr': 'Policija na državnom nivou izvlačenjem pobednika i gubitnika iz zakonskih tekstova', 'si': '{M} විශේෂකයි {U.S.} රාජ්\u200dය-තත්වය පොලිසිකාරීන් විද්\u200dයාපකයෝ සහ විද්\u200dයාපකයෝ විද්\u200dයාපකයෝ පාළුවන්', 'so': '{M} odeling {U.S.} Policies of State-level by Extracting Winners and Losers from Legislative Text', 'sv': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Policyer på statlig nivå genom att extrahera vinnare och förlorare från lagstiftningstexter', 'ta': '{M} odeling {U.S.} நாட்டு- நிலை கொள்கைகளை வெளியேற்றி வெற்றியாளர்கள் மற்றும் தோல்விகள் சட்ட உரைகளிலிருந்து அழைத்து', 'ur': '{M} اوڈلینگ {U.S.} سٹیٹ سٹیٹ سٹیٹ سٹیٹ پلیسی کو قانون متن سے غالب اور ہلاک کرنے والوں کو نکال کر', 'uz': '{M} odeling {U.S.} State- level Policies by Extracting Winners and Losers from Legislative Text', 'vi': 'Hoạt cảnh cấp quốc gia bằng cách chia ra những người thắng và thua từ các văn bản lập pháp', 'bg': '{М}моделиране на политики на държавно ниво чрез извличане на победители и загуби от законодателни текстове', 'nl': '{M}modeling {U.S.} Beleid op staatsniveau door winnaars en verliezers uit wetsteksten te halen', 'hr': 'Policija državne razine izvlačenjem pobjednika i gubitnika iz zakonskih tekstova', 'da': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Politikker på statsniveau ved at udtrække vindere og tabere fra lovgivningsmæssige tekster', 'de': '{M}Modellierung {U.S.} Politik auf staatlicher Ebene durch Herausziehen von Gewinnern und Verlierern aus Gesetzestexten', 'ko': '{M} 입법문에서 승자와 패자를 추출하여 주 1급 정책을 제정', 'id': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Polisi Tingkat Negeri oleh Ekstraksi Pemenang dan Kehilang dari Teks Legislatif', 'fa': 'با اخراج از برنده\u200cها و بازنده\u200cها از متن\u200cهای قانونی', 'sw': '{M} odeling {U.S.} Sera za Taifa kwa Kutoa Washindi na Washindi kutoka Maandishi ya Sheria', 'af': '{M} ontkoppel {U.S.} Staatsvlak beleid deur Winners en Losers uit Legislative Texts uitpak', 'tr': '{M} Kanunlar Metinden Kazananlary we Loserleri Açmak üçin {U.S.} Halt-Seviye Polisileri', 'am': '{M} odeling {U.S.} State-Level Policies by Extracting Winners and Losers from Legislative Text', 'az': '{M}: {U.S.} Eyalet-s톛viyy톛d톛 siyas톛tl톛ri qazananlar캼 v톛 Z톛nginl톛ri Legislative Textl톛rd톛n 칂캼qaraq', 'hy': "{M}ոդելինգ{ԱՄՆ}Նահանգային մակարդակի քաղաքականություն' հաղթերին և կորցներին հանելով Լեգիզլատիվ տեքստներից", 'bn': '{M} ডোডেলিং {U.S.} রাষ্ট্রীয় স্তরের নীতি বিজয়ী এবং লেখা থেকে হারিয়েছেন', 'bs': 'Policija na državnom nivou izvlačenjem pobjednika i gubitnika iz zakonskih tekstova', 'ca': '{M}modelar {Estats Units} Polítiques a nivell estatal extraint guanyadors i perdedors dels textos legislatius', 'cs': '{M}modelování {U.S.} Politiky státní úrovně extrahováním vítězů a poražených z legislativních textů', 'et': '{M}modelleerimine {U.S.} Riigi tasandi poliitika, võitjate ja kaotajate väljavõtmine seadusandlikest tekstidest', 'sq': '{M}odeling {U.S.} Politika në nivel shtetëror nga nxjerrja e fituesve dhe humbësve nga tekstet legjislative', 'fi': '{M}mallinnus {U.S.} Valtiotason k채yt채nn철t poimimalla voittajia ja h채vi채ji채 lains채채d채nn철llisist채 teksteist채', 'jv': 'Video Library', 'ha': '%s', 'sk': '{M}modeliranje {U.S.} politik na državni ravni z izločanjem zmagovalcev in poražencev iz zakonodajnih besedil', 'he': 'מדיניות ברמה המדינה על ידי מחלץ נצחים ומפסידים מהטקסטים החוקים', 'bo': '{M}odeling {U.S.} State-Level Policies by Extracting Winners and Losers from Legislative Texts'}
{'en': 'Crowdsourcing has emerged as a popular approach for collecting annotated data to train supervised machine learning models However annotator bias can lead to defective annotations Though there are a few works investigating individual annotator bias the group effects in annotators are largely overlooked In this work we reveal that annotators within the same demographic group tend to show consistent group bias in annotation tasks and thus we conduct an initial study on annotator group bias We first empirically verify the existence of annotator group bias in various real world crowdsourcing datasets Then we develop a novel probabilistic graphical framework GroupAnno to capture annotator group bias with an extended Expectation Maximization EM algorithm We conduct experiments on both synthetic and real world datasets Experimental results demonstrate the effectiveness of our model in modeling annotator group bias in label aggregation and model learning over competitive baselines', 'ar': 'للقرارات المتعلقة بالسياسات على مستوى الدولة تأثير عميق على العديد من جوانب حياتنا اليومية ، مثل الرعاية الصحية والوصول إلى التعليم. ومع ذلك ، هناك القليل من الفهم لكيفية تشكيل هذه السياسات والقرارات في العملية التشريعية. نحن نتبع نهجًا يعتمد على البيانات من خلال فك شفرة تأثير التشريعات على أصحاب المصلحة المعنيين (على سبيل المثال ، المعلمون في مشاريع قوانين التعليم) لفهم عملية صنع القرار من جانب المشرعين والأصوات. نحن نبني مجموعة بيانات جديدة لعدة ولايات أمريكية تربط مصادر متعددة للبيانات بما في ذلك الفواتير وأصحاب المصلحة والمشرعين والمانحين الماليين. بعد ذلك ، نقوم بتطوير نموذج نصي قائم على الرسم البياني لتضمين وتحليل فواتير الدولة. يتنبأ نموذجنا بالفائزين / الخاسرين في مشروعات القوانين ثم يستخدمهم لتحديد توزيع تصويت الهيئة التشريعية بشكل أفضل وفقًا للمعايير الديموغرافية / الأيديولوجية ، مثل الجنس.', 'pt': 'As decisões sobre políticas estaduais têm um efeito profundo em muitos aspectos de nossa vida cotidiana, como o acesso à saúde e à educação. No entanto, há pouca compreensão de como essas políticas e decisões estão sendo formadas no processo legislativo. Adotamos uma abordagem baseada em dados ao decodificar o impacto da legislação sobre as partes interessadas relevantes (por exemplo, professores em projetos de educação) para entender o processo de tomada de decisão e os votos dos legisladores. Construímos um novo conjunto de dados para vários estados dos EUA que interconecta várias fontes de dados, incluindo projetos de lei, partes interessadas, legisladores e doadores de dinheiro. Em seguida, desenvolvemos um modelo baseado em grafos textuais para incorporar e analisar projetos de lei estaduais. Nosso modelo prevê vencedores/perdedores de projetos de lei e, em seguida, os utiliza para determinar melhor a divisão de votos do corpo legislativo de acordo com critérios demográficos/ideológicos, por exemplo, gênero.', 'fr': "Les décisions relatives aux politiques au niveau de l'État ont une incidence profonde sur de nombreux aspects de notre vie quotidienne, tels que l'accès aux soins de santé et à l'éducation. Cependant, on comprend mal comment ces politiques et décisions sont élaborées dans le cadre du processus législatif. Nous adoptons une approche axée sur les données en décodant l'impact de la législation sur les parties prenantes concernées (par exemple, les projets de loi sur les enseignants dans l'éducation) afin de comprendre le processus décisionnel et les votes des législateurs Nous créons un nouveau jeu de données pour plusieurs États américains qui interconnecte plusieurs sources de données, y compris les projets de loi, les parties prenantes, les législateurs et les donateurs. Ensuite, nous développons un modèle basé sur des graphiques textuels pour intégrer et analyser les projets de loi de l'État. Notre modèle prédit les gagnants/perdants des projets de loi, puis les utilise pour mieux déterminer la répartition des voix du corps législatif en fonction de critères démographiques/idéologiques, par exemple le sexe.", 'es': 'Las decisiones sobre políticas a nivel estatal tienen un profundo efecto en muchos aspectos de nuestra vida diaria, como la atención médica y el acceso a la educación. Sin embargo, hay poca comprensión de cómo se están formando estas políticas y decisiones en el proceso legislativo. Adoptamos un enfoque basado en datos al decodificar el impacto de la legislación en las partes interesadas pertinentes (por ejemplo, los proyectos de ley de docentes en educación) para comprender el proceso de toma de decisiones y los votos de los legisl Creamos un nuevo conjunto de datos para varios estados de EE. UU. que interconecta múltiples fuentes de datos, incluidos proyectos de ley, partes interesadas, legisladores y donantes de dinero. A continuación, desarrollamos un modelo basado en gráficos textuales para integrar y analizar los proyectos de ley estatales. Nuestro modelo predice los ganadores/perdedores de los proyectos de ley y luego los utiliza para determinar mejor el desglose de los votos del cuerpo legislativo de acuerdo con criterios demográficos/ideológicos, por ejemplo, el género.', 'ja': '州レベルの政策の決定は、医療や教育へのアクセスなど、私たちの日常生活の多くの側面に深い影響を与えます。しかし、これらの政策や決定が立法プロセスでどのように形成されているかについてはほとんど理解されていない。私たちは、立法者の意思決定プロセスと投票を理解するために、関連するステークホルダー（例えば、教育法案の教師）に対する立法の影響をデコードすることによって、データ主導のアプローチを取っています。私たちは、請求書、利害関係者、立法者、寄付者などの複数のデータソースを相互接続する、複数の米国州の新しいデータセットを構築しています。次に、州の請求書を埋め込み、分析するためのテキストグラフベースのモデルを開発します。私たちのモデルは、法案の勝者/敗者を予測し、その後それらを利用して、人口統計的/イデオロギー的基準（例えば、性別）に基づいて立法機関の投票の内訳をより良く決定します。', 'zh': '州政多深远,如医疗保健教之会。  然立法之道,何以成知之甚少? 数驱之法,因解码立法相关利相关者(如教法案师),以知立法者决策之投票。 为美国数州构一新集,当数集将数数据源(及法案、利相关者、立法者、资捐赠者)互连。 接下来,我们开发一个基于文本图形的模样来嵌入和析州账单。 吾法案之赢家/输家,然后因之以计/意识形态(如性别)更定立法机构之投票细分。', 'ru': 'Решения в отношении политики на уровне штатов оказывают глубокое воздействие на многие аспекты нашей повседневной жизни, такие, как здравоохранение и доступ к образованию.  Однако мало кто понимает, каким образом эти стратегии и решения формируются в рамках законодательного процесса. Мы используем подход, основанный на данных, путем расшифровки влияния законодательства на соответствующие заинтересованные стороны (например, учителя в законопроектах об образовании), чтобы понять процесс принятия решений и голосования законодателей. Мы создаем новый набор данных для нескольких штатов США, который объединяет несколько источников данных, включая счета, заинтересованные стороны, законодателей и доноров денежных средств. Далее мы разрабатываем текстовую графоподобную модель для встраивания и анализа государственных законопроектов. Наша модель предсказывает победителей/проигравших законопроектов, а затем использует их для лучшего определения разбивки голосов законодательного органа в соответствии с демографическими/идеологическими критериями, например, по признаку пола.', 'hi': 'राज्य-स्तरीय नीतियों पर निर्णय हमारे रोजमर्रा के जीवन के कई पहलुओं पर गहरा प्रभाव डालते हैं, जैसे कि स्वास्थ्य देखभाल और शिक्षा पहुंच।  हालांकि, इस बात की बहुत कम समझ है कि विधायी प्रक्रिया में इन नीतियों और निर्णयों का गठन कैसे किया जा रहा है। हम विधायकों की निर्णय लेने की प्रक्रिया और वोटों को समझने के लिए प्रासंगिक हितधारकों (जैसे, शिक्षा बिलों में शिक्षकों) पर कानून के प्रभाव को डिकोड करके एक डेटा-संचालित दृष्टिकोण लेते हैं। हम कई अमेरिकी राज्यों के लिए एक नया डेटासेट बनाते हैं जो बिलों, हितधारकों, विधायकों और धन दाताओं सहित डेटा के कई स्रोतों को आपस में जोड़ता है। अगला, हम राज्य बिलों को एम्बेड करने और विश्लेषण करने के लिए एक पाठ्य ग्राफ-आधारित मॉडल विकसित करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल बिलों के विजेताओं / हारने वालों की भविष्यवाणी करता है और फिर जनसांख्यिकीय / वैचारिक मानदंडों के अनुसार विधायी निकाय के वोट टूटने को बेहतर ढंग से निर्धारित करने के लिए उनका उपयोग करता है, उदाहरण के लिए, लिंग।', 'ga': 'Bíonn tionchar domhain ag cinntí ar bheartais ar leibhéal an stáit ar go leor gnéithe dár saol laethúil, ar nós cúram sláinte agus rochtain ar oideachas. Mar sin féin, is beag tuiscint atá ar an gcaoi a bhfuil na beartais agus na cinntí seo á ndéanamh sa phróiseas reachtaíochta. Glacaimid cur chuige bunaithe ar shonraí trí thionchar na reachtaíochta ar pháirtithe leasmhara ábhartha (m.sh., múinteoirí i mbillí oideachais) a dhíchódú chun próiseas cinnteoireachta agus vótaí na reachtóirí a thuiscint. Déanaimid tacar sonraí nua a thógáil le haghaidh stát iolrach de chuid na SA a idirnascann foinsí iolracha sonraí lena n-áirítear billí, geallsealbhóirí, reachtóirí, agus deontóirí airgid. Ansin, forbraímid múnla téacsbhunaithe graf-bhunaithe chun billí stáit a leabú agus a anailísiú. Déanann ár múnla buaiteoirí/caillteanais billí a thuar agus ansin baintear úsáid astu chun miondealú vótaí an chomhlachta reachtaigh a chinneadh níos fearr de réir critéar déimeagrafach/idé-eolaíoch, m.sh., inscne.', 'el': 'Οι αποφάσεις για πολιτικές σε κρατικό επίπεδο έχουν βαθιά επίδραση σε πολλές πτυχές της καθημερινής μας ζωής, όπως η υγειονομική περίθαλψη και η πρόσβαση στην εκπαίδευση. Ωστόσο, υπάρχει ελάχιστη κατανόηση του τρόπου με τον οποίο διαμορφώνονται αυτές οι πολιτικές και οι αποφάσεις κατά τη νομοθετική διαδικασία. Ακολουθούμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη στα δεδομένα αποκωδικοποιώντας τον αντίκτυπο της νομοθεσίας στους σχετικούς ενδιαφερόμενους (π.χ. εκπαιδευτικούς σε νομοσχέδια εκπαίδευσης) για να κατανοήσουμε τη διαδικασία λήψης αποφάσεων και τις ψήφους των νομοθετών. Κατασκευάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων για πολλές πολιτείες των ΗΠΑ που συνδέει πολλαπλές πηγές δεδομένων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων λογαριασμών, ενδιαφερόμενων μερών, νομοθετών και δωρητών χρημάτων. Στη συνέχεια, αναπτύσσουμε ένα κείμενο μοντέλο βασισμένο σε γραφήματα για την ενσωμάτωση και ανάλυση κρατικών λογαριασμών. Το μοντέλο μας προβλέπει νικητές/ηττημένους νομοθεσιών και στη συνέχεια τα χρησιμοποιεί για να καθορίσει καλύτερα την κατανομή ψήφου του νομοθετικού οργάνου σύμφωνα με δημογραφικά/ιδεολογικά κριτήρια, π.χ. φύλο.', 'hu': 'Az állami szintű politikákkal kapcsolatos döntések mély hatással vannak mindennapi életünk számos aspektusára, például az egészségügyre és az oktatáshoz való hozzáférésre. Mindazonáltal kevés a megértés arról, hogy ezek a politikák és döntések hogyan alakulnak ki a jogalkotási folyamat során. Adatközpontú megközelítést alkalmazunk azáltal, hogy dekódoljuk a jogszabályoknak az érintett érdekelt felekre (például oktatási törvényekben szereplő tanárokra) gyakorolt hatását, hogy megértsük a jogalkotók döntéshozatali folyamatát és szavazásait. Új adatkészletet építünk több amerikai állam számára, amely több adatforrást összekapcsol, beleértve a törvényjavaslatokat, az érdekelt feleket, a jogalkotókat és a pénzadományozókat. Ezután kidolgozunk egy szöveges grafikon alapú modellt az állami számlák beágyazására és elemzésére. Modellünk előrejelzi a törvényjavaslatok nyerteseit/veszteseit, majd ezeket arra használja fel, hogy jobban meghatározza a törvényhozó testület szavazatbontását demográfiai/ideológiai kritériumok, pl. nemek szerint.', 'ka': "განსაზღვრებების პოლიტიკის განსაზღვრებით უფრო ძალიან ეფექტი აქვს ჩვენი ყოველდღეული ცხოვრებას, როგორც ჯანმრთელობა და განსწავლება. მაგრამ არსებობს ცოტა პასუხი თუ როგორ ეს პოლიტიკური და გადაწყვეტილების შექმნა legislative პროცესში. ჩვენ მივიღეთ მონაცემების მონაცემები, რომელიც კონფიგურაციას შესაძლებელი ინტერესონებისთვის (მაგალითად, სწავლებელი განსწავლებელი წიგნის წიგნის) სხვადასხვა პროცესის გადაწ ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია ამერიკული ქვეყნებისთვის, რომელიც მრავალი მონაცემების გამოყენება, ანუ ახალი მონაცემები, დაინტერესონები, legislators შემდეგ, ჩვენ ტექსტუალური გრაფიკური მოდელის განვითარებით, რომელიც სტატური წიგნის შექმნა და ანალიზაციისთვის. ჩვენი მოდელი წინასწარმოდგენს მობიდნენტები/წინასწარმოდგენელები და შემდეგ ისინი გამოყენებს, რომ უფრო უფრო განსაზღვრთოდ გადაწყვეტილება legislative body's vote breakdown according to demographic/ideological criteria, e.", 'it': "Le decisioni sulle politiche statali hanno un profondo effetto su molti aspetti della nostra vita quotidiana, come l'assistenza sanitaria e l'accesso all'istruzione. Tuttavia, c'è poca comprensione di come queste politiche e decisioni si stanno formando nel processo legislativo. Adottiamo un approccio basato sui dati decodificando l'impatto della legislazione sulle parti interessate (ad esempio, gli insegnanti nelle leggi sull'istruzione) per comprendere il processo decisionale e le votazioni dei legislatori. Costruiamo un nuovo set di dati per diversi Stati Uniti che collega più fonti di dati tra cui fatture, stakeholder, legislatori e donatori di denaro. Successivamente, sviluppiamo un modello testuale basato su grafici per incorporare e analizzare le fatture statali. Il nostro modello prevede vincitori/perdenti dei progetti di legge e li utilizza per determinare meglio la ripartizione dei voti dell'organo legislativo in base a criteri demografici/ideologici, ad esempio il genere.", 'kk': 'Күй-жай деңгейіндегі саясаттардың шешімдері күнделікті өміріміздің көптеген аспектеріне, мысалы, саулық сақтау және білім беру әрекеттерінің көптеген әсер Бірақ бұл саясаттар мен шешімдердің заң шығару процесінде қалай жасалғанын білмейді. Біз мәліметтердің шешімдеу процесін және сайлауларды түсінуге арналған заң қатынасын (мысалы, білім беру заң мұғалімдерінің мұғалімдері) шешімдеу және қатынасын түсінуге арналған деректерді бақы Біз бірнеше АҚШ елдерінің жаңа деректер жинағын құрамыз. Бірнеше деректер көзінің бірнеше көзінің бірінші көзіне сәйкес, қатысушылар, законодаторлар және ақша доно Келесіден, күй сандарын ендіру және анализ үшін мәтіндік графикалық негіздеген үлгі құрамыз. Біздің үлгіміз жетістірушілерді/жоғалтырушыларды таңдап, содан кейін оларды заң шығарушының дауыс бөлігін демографиялық/идеологиялық критерияларына сәйкес, мысалы, гендерді анықтау үшін жақ', 'lt': "Sprendimai dėl valstybės lygmens politikos turi didelį poveikį daugeliui mūsų kasdienio gyvenimo aspektų, pvz., sveikatos priežiūros ir švietimo galimybių. Tačiau nėra suprantama, kaip teisėkūros procese formuojama ši politika ir sprendimai. We take a data-driven approach by decoding the impact of legislation on relevant stakeholders (e.g., teachers in education bills) to understand legislators' decision-making process and votes.  Kuriame naują duomenų rinkinį kelioms JAV valstybėms, kuris sujungia įvairius duomenų šaltinius, įskaitant sąskaitas faktūras, suinteresuotąsias šalis, teisės aktų leidėjus ir pinigų teikėjus. Toliau parengiame tekstiniu grafiniu modeliu pagrįstą model į, skirtą įtraukti ir analizuoti valstybės sąskaitas. Our model predicts winners/losers of bills and then utilizes them to better determine the legislative body's vote breakdown according to demographic/ideological criteria, e.g., gender.", 'mk': 'Одлуките за политиката на државно ниво имаат длабоко влијание врз многу аспекти на нашиот секојдневен живот, како што се здравствената заштита и пристапот до образованието. Сепак, постои мало разбирање како овие политики и одлуки се формираат во легислативниот процес. Ние го прифаќаме пристапот врз основа на податоци со декодирање на влијанието на легислативата врз релевантните интересни страни (на пример, учителите во законите за образование) за да го разбереме процесот на донесување одлуки и гласовите на закон Ние изградуваме нови податоци за повеќето американски држави кои меѓусебно ги поврзуваат повеќето извори на податоци, вклучително и сметките за сметки, интересни страни, законодавци и донатори на пари. Следно, развиваме текстуален графски модел за вградување и анализа на државните сметки. Нашиот модел предвидува победници/губитници на законите и потоа ги користи за подобро да се одреди разделот на гласовите на законодавниот тел според демографските/идеолошки критериуми, на пример полот.', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റേറ്റ് നിലനില പോലീസുകളെക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള തീരുമാനങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ദിവസവും ജീവിതത്തിന്റെ കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ആഴത്തി എങ്കിലും നിയമപ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഈ പോളിസികളും തീരുമാനങ്ങളും എങ്ങനെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു എന്ന് മനസ്സിലാക്കുന നിയമങ്ങളുടെ തീരുമാന പ്രക്രിയയും വോട്ടുകളും മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നിയമങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം നിയമങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം കുറെച്ച് കാണിക്കുന് ഒരുപാട് യുഎസ് രാജ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അത് പല വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d തമ Next, we develop a textual graph-based model to embed and analyze state bills.  നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിജയികള്\u200d/നഷ്ടപ്പെടുന്നവരെ പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നിയമത്തിന്റെ ശരീരത്തിന്റെ വോട്ട് തകര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് നല്ലത് ഉപയോഗിക്കു', 'ms': 'Keputusan mengenai polisi aras negara mempunyai kesan yang mendalam pada banyak aspek kehidupan harian kita, seperti rawatan kesehatan dan akses pendidikan. Namun, sedikit faham bagaimana polisi dan keputusan ini dibentuk dalam proses undang-undang. Kami mengambil pendekatan berdasarkan data dengan menyahkod kesan undang-undang pada pihak berminat yang berkaitan (cth., guru dalam bil pendidikan) untuk memahami proses keputusan dan suara-suara penegak undang-undang. We build a new dataset for multiple US states that interconnects multiple sources of data including bills, stakeholders, legislators, and money donors.  Kemudian, kita mengembangkan model berasaskan graf teks untuk memasukkan dan menganalisis bil negara. Model kami meramalkan pemenang/kalah bil-bil dan kemudian menggunakannya untuk menentukan lebih baik pembahagian suara badan undang-undang menurut kriteria demografik/ideologi, misalnya jenis.', 'mt': 'Id-deċiżjonijiet dwar il-politiki fil-livell tal-Istat għandhom effett profond fuq ħafna aspetti tal-ħajja ta’ kuljum tagħna, bħall-kura tas-saħħa u l-a ċċess għall-edukazzjoni. Madankollu, hemm ftit fehim dwar kif dawn il-politiki u d-deċiżjonijiet qed jiġu ffurmati fil-proċess leġiżlattiv. Aħna nieħdu approċċ ibbażat fuq id-dejta billi niżdekodaw l-impatt tal-leġiżlazzjoni fuq il-partijiet interessati rilevanti (pereżempju l-g ħalliema fil-kontijiet tal-edukazzjoni) biex nifhmu l-proċess tat-teħid tad-deċiżjonijiet tal-leġiżlaturi u l-voti. Aħna nibnu sett ġdid ta’ dejta għal diversi stati tal-Istati Uniti li jinterkonnetta diversi sorsi ta’ dejta inklużi l-kontijiet, il-partijiet interessati, il-leġiżlaturi, u d-donaturi tal-flus. Next, we develop a textual graph-based model to embed and analyze state bills.  Il-mudell tagħna jipprevedi r-rebbieħa/dawk li jitilfu l-kontijiet u mbagħad jużahom biex jiddeterminaw aħjar it-tqassim tal-voti tal-korp leġiżlattiv skont il-kriterji demografiċi/ideoloġiċi, pereżempju s-sess.', 'no': 'Beslutningar om tilstand-nivåpolitikk har ein dyp effekt på mange aspektar av vårt kvardag liv, slik som helsetjeneste og utdannelsestilgang. Det er imidlertid lite forståelse av korleis desse politikkene og avgjøringane vert formerte i den lovgivne prosessen. Vi tar e in datadrivt tilnærming ved å dekode effekten av lovgivnaden på relevant stakeholder (f.eks. lærarar i utdanningsbrukar) for å forstå prosessen og stemmer for avgjøring av lovgivnader. Vi bygger eit ny dataset for fleire amerikanske tilstandar som koplar fleire kilder av data, inkludert rådgivningar, stakeholderar, lovgivnader og pengedatorar. Neste utviklar vi eit tekst- grafikkbasert modell for å innebæra og analysera tilstandreglane. Modellen vårt foregår vinnere/taparar av rådgivningar og s å brukar dei for å bestemme stemmeavbrudd av den legislative kroppen etter demografiske/ideologiske kriteria, f.eks. seks.', 'pl': 'Decyzje dotyczące polityki państwowej mają głęboki wpływ na wiele aspektów naszego codziennego życia, takich jak opieka zdrowotna i dostęp do edukacji. Nie ma jednak zrozumienia, w jaki sposób te polityki i decyzje są kształtowane w procesie legislacyjnym. Stosujemy podejście oparte na danych poprzez dekodowanie wpływu prawodawstwa na odpowiednie zainteresowane strony (np. nauczycieli w ustawach o edukacji), aby zrozumieć proces decyzyjny i głosowania ustawodawców. Budujemy nowy zestaw danych dla wielu stanów Stanów Zjednoczonych, który łączy wiele źródeł danych, w tym rachunki, interesariusze, ustawodawców i darczyńców pieniężnych. Następnie opracowujemy model tekstowy oparty na wykresie do osadzania i analizy rachunków stanowych. Nasz model przewiduje zwycięzców/przegranych ustaw, a następnie wykorzystuje je do lepszego określenia podziału głosów organu ustawodawczego według kryteriów demograficznych/ideologicznych, np. płci.', 'sr': 'Odluke o politikama na državnom nivou imaju duboko uticaj na mnoge aspekte našeg svakodnevnog života, poput pristupa zdravstvenom skrbi i obrazovanju. Međutim, malo razumevanja o tome kako se te politike i odluke formiraju u zakonodavnom procesu. Prihvaćamo podatkovni pristup dekodiranjem utjecaja zakonodavstva na relevantne dionice (npr. nastavnike u obrazovnim računima) da bi razumeli proces donošenja odluka i glasanja zakonodavstva. Napravili smo novi set podataka za višestruke američke države koje međusobno povezuju višestruke izvore podataka uključujući račune, dionice, zakonodavce i donatore novca. Sledeće, razvijamo tekstualni model na grafiku kako bi uključili i analizirali državne račune. Naš model predviđa pobednike/gubitnike računa i onda ih iskoristi kako bi bolje odredili raskidanje glasova zakonodavnog tijela u skladu sa demografičkim/ideološkim kriterijama, npr. spol.', 'si': 'රාජ්\u200dය ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ තීර්ණාවට අපේ හැමදාම ජීවිතයේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් තියෙනවා, වගේම ආරෝක්ෂ නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරධානය සහ තීරණය කොහොමද නීතිපත්ති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා ගැන පොඩි තේරු අපි දත්ත ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විධානයක් ගන්නවා නියෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් (උදාහරණය, ශීෂාව අපි අළුත් දත්ත සැට් එකක් හදන්නේ ඇමරිකානු ජාතිය වලින් ගොඩක් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා බිල්ල්, සැකසුම් අයි ඊළඟට, අපි පැත්තක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න සහ විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න. අපේ මන්ද්\u200dරය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා බිල්ල් වලින් ජීවත්වයෝ/නැතිවෙන්නේ පස්සේ ඔවුන්ව පාවිච්චි කරනවා ඒ වගේම නීතිපත්තික ශරීරයේ වි', 'so': "Go’aanka ku saabsan siyaasada heerka dowladu waxay saameyn dheer ku leeyihiin dhinacyo badan oo nololeennaga, tusaale ahaan daryeelka caafimaadka iyo helitaanka waxbarashada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, wax yar ma garanayno sida siyaasadahan iyo go'aanyadu u sameeyaan xiliga sharciga. Waxaannu qaadannaa qaab lagu wado macluumaad, si aan u garanaynno go’aanka go’aanka sharciyada iyo codeynta sharciyada. Waxaannu dhisaynaa sawir cusub oo u qoran wadamada Mareykanka oo kala duduwan, kaas oo isku xiraya noocyo badan oo macluumaad ah, kuwaas oo ka mid ah biil, mushaarro, sharciyad, lacag bixiyayaal. Meel dambe waxaynu horumarinaa model qoraal ah oo ku saleysan karta iyo baaritaanka qoraalka. Tusaale'yadeenu wuxuu horumariyaa kuwa guulaysan/khasaaray mushaarada kadibna wuxuu u isticmaali karaa si aad ugu fiican u caddeyso burburka codka sharciga, sida ay yihiin qiimaha dadkaas/fikradda, tusaale ahaan jinsiga.", 'mn': 'Улс төвшин бодлогын шийдвэр бидний өдөр тутмын амьдралын олон асуудлууд, эрүүл мэндийн тусламжтай болон боловсрол хүртэл маш их нөлөөлдөг. Гэхдээ эдгээр бодлогууд, шийдвэрлэл хэрхэн хуулийн үйлдвэрлэлд байдаг талаар бага зэрэг ойлголт биш. Бид зөвлөгчийн шийдвэр гаргах үйл явц болон сонголтыг ойлгохын тулд зөвлөгөөний нөлөөг (жишээ нь, боловсролын хуулийн багш нар) захирагчидын шийдвэр гаргах үйл явц болон санал өгдөг. Бид олон Америкийн улс орнуудын шинэ өгөгдлийн сангуудыг бүтээж, худалдааны, захирагчид, мөнгө хандивлагчид холбоотой олон эх үүсвэрийг холбоотой. Дараагийн дараа, бид улс төрийн төлбөрийг дүгнэх, шинжилгээ хийх textual graph-based загварыг хөгжүүлнэ. Бидний загвар нь ялагчдыг/ялагчдыг таамагладаг. Тэгээд хуулийн орнуудын сонголтыг илүү сайн тогтоохын тулд тэднийг ашигладаг.', 'ro': 'Deciziile privind politicile la nivel de stat au un efect profund asupra multor aspecte ale vieții noastre cotidiene, cum ar fi asistența medicală și accesul la educație. Cu toate acestea, există puțină înțelegere a modului în care aceste politici și decizii sunt formate în procesul legislativ. Luăm o abordare bazată pe date prin decodarea impactului legislației asupra părților interesate relevante (de exemplu, profesorii din proiectele de lege privind educația) pentru a înțelege procesul decizional și voturile legiuitorilor. Construim un nou set de date pentru mai multe state americane care interconectează mai multe surse de date, inclusiv proiecte de lege, părți interesate, legiuitori și donatori de bani. Apoi, dezvoltăm un model bazat pe grafice textuale pentru a încorpora și analiza facturile de stat. Modelul nostru prezice câștigătorii/pierzătorii proiectelor de lege și apoi le utilizează pentru a determina mai bine defalcarea voturilor organismului legislativ în funcție de criteriile demografice/ideologice, de exemplu, sexul.', 'sv': 'Beslut om politik på statlig nivå har en djup inverkan på många aspekter av vår vardag, till exempel hälso- och sjukvård och tillgång till utbildning. Det finns dock en liten förståelse för hur dessa strategier och beslut utformas i lagstiftningsprocessen. Vi använder ett datadrivet tillvägagångssätt genom att avkoda lagstiftningens inverkan på relevanta intressenter (t.ex. lärare i utbildningslagförslag) för att förstå lagstiftarnas beslutsprocess och omröstningar. Vi bygger en ny datauppsättning för flera amerikanska stater som sammankopplar flera datakällor, inklusive lagförslag, intressenter, lagstiftare och penninggivare. Därefter utvecklar vi en textbaserad grafbaserad modell för att bädda in och analysera statsräkningar. Vår modell förutspår vinnare/förlorare av lagförslag och använder dem sedan för att bättre avgöra lagstiftningsorganets röstfördelning enligt demografiska/ideologiska kriterier, t.ex. kön.', 'ta': 'நாட்டு நிலை கொள்கைகள் மீது தீர்மானிப்புகள் தீர்மானிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது எங்கள் நாள் வாழ்க்கையின் பல விளைவுகளில்,  ஆனால், இந்த கொள்கைகள் மற்றும் தீர்ப்புகள் எவ்வாறு வடிவமைக்கப்படுகின்றன என்பதை புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியாது. நாம் ஒரு தரவு இயக்கும் செயல்பாடு எடுத்துக் கொண்டு தொடர்பு நிலைபெறுபவர்களுக்கு விளைவுகளை குறைவாக்குவதற்கு (உ. ம். கல்விப்பாட்டில் ஆசி நாம் பல அமெரிக்க நாடுகளுக்கான புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம். அது பல தரவுகளின் மூலங்களை இணைக்கிறது. பில்லுகள், ஒதுக்குப் ப அடுத்து, நாம் மாநிலை வரைபடம் அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் நிலை பில்களை ஆராய்க்க. நம்முடைய மாதிரி வெற்றியாளர்/பில்லுகள் நஷ்டமடைந்தவர்களை முன்வாக்குகிறது மற்றும் அதை பயன்படுத்துகிறது சிறப்பாக நிறுவனம் உடலின் வாக்கு முறி', 'ur': 'ہمارے روزہ زندگی کے بہت سے منطق پر، جیسے سلامتی کی مراقبت اور تحصیل کی دسترسی کے لئے، دولت سطح پولیس کے بارے میں فیصلہ کرنا بہت اثر ہے۔ However, there is little understanding of how these policies and decisions are formed in the legislative process. ہم ایک دکھانے والی طریقہ لے رہے ہیں کہ قانون کے مطابق معاملہ داروں پر (جیسا کہ تعلیم بیلوں کے معاملہ داروں کے معاملہ میں استعمال کرنے والے) قانون کے فیصلہ کرنے کے طریقے اور وٹوں کو سمجھ سکیں۔ ہم نے بہت سی ایالات متحدہ ایالات کے لئے ایک نئی ڈیٹ سٹ بنایا ہے جو بیل، علاقمند ہولنے والے، قانون دینے والے، اور پول دینے والے کے شامل بہت سی سراسر ڈیٹ کو متصل کرتا ہے. آگے، ہم ایک ٹیکسٹل گراف بنیادی موڈل کو ایمبر اور تحلیل کرنے کے لئے اختیار کرتے ہیں. ہماری مدل کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے جو غلبہ کرنے والوں/خسارہ کرنے والوں کو اور اس کے بعد ان کو اچھی طرح قانون کی جسم کا وٹ ٹکڑ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے، جیسے جنس کے مطابق.', 'uz': "davlat qoidalari davlat qoidalarimiz har kuni hayotimizning ko'pgina qismlariga, huddi saqlash va ta'lim imkoniyatini qo'llashadi. . Шундай қилиб, ушбу қонунлар ва ҳукмлар қонун равишда қандай яратилишини кам тушунмаймиз. Биз қонунларнинг ҳукуматларини ёзиш ва овозларини тушунтириш (масалан, ta'lim қонунларидаги ходимлар) аъзоларининг таъсирини бажариш ва фойдаланиш учун маълумотлар сақланган манфаатларни бажаришга олиб борамиз. Biz bir nechta AQSH davlatlari uchun yangi maʼlumot tarkibini yaratimiz. Bir nechta maʼlumot manbalarini bir nechta bog'lash mumkin. Keyingi, biz davlat Billlarini aniqlash uchun matn asosiy grafik modelini yaratishmiz. Our model predicts winners/losers of bills and then utilizes them to better determine the legislative body's vote breakdown according to demographic/ideological criteria, e.g., gender.", 'vi': 'Những quyết định về chính sách quốc gia có ảnh hưởng sâu sắc đến nhiều khía cạnh trong cuộc sống hàng ngày của chúng ta, như là quyền được chăm sóc y tế và giáo dục. Tuy nhiên, rất ít hiểu về cách những chính sách và quyết định này được hình thành trong quá trình lập pháp. Chúng ta sử dụng một phương pháp dựa trên dữ liệu bằng cách giải mã tác động của pháp luật lên các cá nhân liên quan (v. d. giáo viên trong hóa đơn giáo dục) để hiểu được tiến trình quyết định và bỏ phiếu của luật. Chúng tôi xây dựng một tập hợp dữ liệu mới cho nhiều bang Mỹ liên kết nhiều nguồn dữ liệu bao gồm các hóa đơn, những người động viên, người lập pháp, và những người hiến tiền. Tiếp theo, chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình vẽ dựa vào đồ thị để nhúng và phân tích hóa đơn. Kiểu mẫu của chúng ta dự đoán người thắng hoặc kẻ thua trong các hóa đơn và sau đó s ử dụng chúng để xác định tỉ lệ phiếu của cơ quan pháp luật dựa trên tiêu chuẩn dân số/xung phong, v.d. giới tính.', 'da': 'Beslutninger om politikker på statsplan har en dyb indvirkning på mange aspekter af vores hverdag, såsom sundhedspleje og adgang til uddannelse. Der er imidlertid ringe forståelse for, hvordan disse politikker og beslutninger udformes i lovgivningsprocessen. Vi anvender en datadrevet tilgang ved at afkode lovgivningens indvirkning på relevante interessenter (f.eks. lærere i uddannelseslovgivninger) for at forstå lovgivernes beslutningsproces og afstemninger. Vi bygger et nyt datasæt for flere amerikanske stater, der sammenkobler flere datakilder, herunder lovforslag, interessenter, lovgivere og penge donorer. Dernæst udvikler vi en tekstgrafbaseret model til at integrere og analysere statsregninger. Vores model forudsiger vindere/tabere af lovforslag og bruger dem derefter til bedre at bestemme det lovgivende organs stemmefordeling ud fra demografiske/ideologiske kriterier, f.eks. køn.', 'de': 'Entscheidungen über staatliche Politiken haben tiefgreifende Auswirkungen auf viele Aspekte unseres Alltags, wie Gesundheitsversorgung und Bildungszugang. Es gibt jedoch wenig Verständnis dafür, wie diese Politiken und Entscheidungen im Gesetzgebungsprozess gestaltet werden. Wir verfolgen einen datengetriebenen Ansatz, indem wir die Auswirkungen der Gesetzgebung auf relevante Stakeholder (z.B. Lehrer in Bildungsgesetzen) entschlüsseln, um den Entscheidungsprozess und die Abstimmung des Gesetzgebers zu verstehen. Wir erstellen einen neuen Datensatz für mehrere US-Staaten, der mehrere Datenquellen miteinander verbindet, einschließlich Rechnungen, Stakeholder, Gesetzgeber und Geldgeber. Als nächstes entwickeln wir ein textuelles graphenbasiertes Modell zur Einbettung und Analyse von Staatsrechnungen. Unser Modell prognostiziert Gewinner/Verlierer von Gesetzentwürfen und nutzt diese dann, um die Stimmenverteilung des Gesetzgebers nach demografischen/ideologischen Kriterien, z.B. Geschlecht, besser zu bestimmen.', 'id': 'Keputusan tentang kebijakan tingkat negara memiliki efek dalam pada banyak aspek kehidupan harian kita, seperti perawatan kesehatan dan akses pendidikan. Namun, ada sedikit pemahaman tentang bagaimana kebijakan dan keputusan ini dibentuk dalam proses legislatif. Kami mengambil pendekatan berdasarkan data dengan mendekodifikasi dampak dari undang-undang pada pihak berwenang relevan (contohnya guru dalam tagihan pendidikan) untuk memahami proses pembuat keputusan dan pemilihan suara. We build a new dataset for multiple US states that interconnects multiple sources of data including bills, stakeholders, legislators, and money donors.  Selanjutnya, kita mengembangkan model berbasis grafik tekstual untuk memasukkan dan menganalisis tagihan negara. Model kami memprediksi pemenang/pecundang tagihan dan kemudian menggunakannya untuk menentukan lebih baik pembahagian pemilihan tubuh legislatif menurut kriteria demografi/ideologi, misalnya jenis.', 'ko': '주 1급 정책에 대한 결정은 의료 보건과 교육 기회 등 우리의 일상생활에 깊은 영향을 미친다.그러나 이런 정책과 결정이 어떻게 입법 과정에서 이루어졌는지에 대해 아는 사람은 드물다.우리는 데이터 구동 방법을 이용하여 입법이 관련 이해관계자(예를 들어 교육 법안 중의 교사)에게 미치는 영향을 디코딩하여 입법자의 결정 과정과 투표를 이해한다.우리는 미국 여러 주를 위해 새로운 데이터 집합을 구축하여 법안, 이해관계자, 입법자, 기부자 등 여러 데이터 원천을 연결시켰다.다음에 우리는 주 계산서를 삽입하고 분석하기 위해 텍스트 그래프를 기반으로 한 모델을 개발했다.우리의 모델은 법안의 승자/패자를 예측한 다음에 그것들을 이용하여 인구/이데올로기 기준(예를 들어 성별)에 따라 입법 기구의 투표 세목을 더욱 잘 확정한다.', 'bg': 'Решенията относно политиките на държавно равнище имат дълбок ефект върху много аспекти от ежедневието ни, като например достъпа до здравеопазване и образование. Има обаче малко разбиране за това как тези политики и решения се формират в законодателния процес. Приемаме подход, основан на данни, като декодираме въздействието на законодателството върху съответните заинтересовани страни (например учителите в проектите за образование), за да разберем процеса на вземане на решения и гласуването на законодателите. Изграждаме нов набор от данни за множество щати в САЩ, който взаимосвързва множество източници на данни, включително законопроекти, заинтересовани страни, законодатели и дарители на пари. След това разработваме текстов графичен модел за вграждане и анализ на държавните законопроекти. Нашият модел прогнозира победителите/губещите в законопроектите и след това ги използва, за да определи по-добре разбивката на гласовете на законодателния орган според демографски/идеологически критерии, напр. пол.', 'nl': 'Beslissingen over overheidsbeleid hebben een diep effect op vele aspecten van ons dagelijks leven, zoals gezondheidszorg en toegang tot onderwijs. Er is echter weinig inzicht in hoe deze beleidsvormen en besluiten in het wetgevingsproces worden gevormd. We hanteren een datagedreven aanpak door de impact van wetgeving op relevante stakeholders (bijvoorbeeld leraren in onderwijswetsvoorstellen) te decoderen om het besluitvormingsproces en de stemming van wetgevers te begrijpen. We bouwen een nieuwe dataset voor meerdere Amerikaanse staten die meerdere gegevensbronnen met elkaar verbindt, waaronder rekeningen, stakeholders, wetgevers en gelddonoren. Vervolgens ontwikkelen we een tekstueel grafiek-gebaseerd model om staatsrekeningen in te sluiten en te analyseren. Ons model voorspelt winnaars/verliezers van wetsvoorstellen en gebruikt deze vervolgens om de stemverdeling van de wetgever beter te bepalen op basis van demografische/ideologische criteria, bijvoorbeeld geslacht.', 'hr': 'Odluke o politikama na državnom nivou imaju duboko utjecaj na mnoge aspekte našeg svakodnevnog života, poput pristupa zdravstvenom skrbi i obrazovanju. Međutim, malo razumijeva kako se te politike i odluke formiraju u zakonodavnom procesu. Prihvaćamo podatkovni pristup dekodiranjem utjecaja zakonodavstva na relevantne dionice (npr. učitelji u obrazovnim računima) kako bi razumjeli proces donošenja odluka i glasanja zakonodavstva. Napravili smo novi set podataka za višestruke američke države koje međusobno povezuju višestruke izvore podataka uključujući račune, dionice, zakonodavce i donatore novca. Sljedeće, razvijamo tekstualni model na grafiku kako bi uključili i analizirali državne račune. Naš model predviđa pobjednike/gubitnike računa i onda ih koristi kako bi bolje utvrdilo raskidanje glasova zakonodavnog tijela u skladu s demografskim/ideološkim kriterijama, npr. spol.', 'sw': 'Maamuzi kuhusu sera za kiwango cha serikali yanaathiri sana mambo mengi ya maisha yetu ya kila siku, kama vile huduma za afya na elimu. ... Hata hivyo, hakuna uelewa wa jinsi sera na maamuzi haya yanavyotengenezwa katika mchakato wa sheria. Tunachukua mbinu zinazoendeshwa na takwimu kwa kupunguza madhara ya sheria kwa wateja madaraka (kwa mfano, walimu katika muswada wa elimu) kuelewa mchakato wa uamuzi wa sheria na kura. Tunaweza kujenga seti mpya ya taarifa kwa majimbo mengi ya Marekani ambayo inaunganisha vyanzo vingi vya data ikiwa ni pamoja na muswada, wateja maduka, wabunge na watoa fedha. Baadae, tunatengeneza muundo wa picha za msingi wa simu ili kuingiza na kuchambua muswada wa serikali. Mfano wetu unabashiri washindi/waliopoteza muswada na kisha inatumia zaidi kuamua uchaguzi wa mwili wa sheria kwa mujibu wa vigezo vya demokrasia/kiitikadi, kwa mfano jinsia.', 'tr': 'Durumyň derejesi politikalaryň çözgütleri günümizdäki durmuşymyzyň, saglyk we bilim elýetleri ýaly köp aspektlerimize gaty täsirleýär. Ýöne bu politikalaryň we kararlaryň nähili kanunladyň procesinde döredilýändigini biraz düşünmek ýok. Biz kanunlaryň kararyny we sesleri çykarmak üçin (meseläm, okuw senagatlarynyň mugallymlarynyň) ýagdaýynyň netijesini çykarmak üçin data ýaly nusgasyny g örýäris. Biz birnäçe ABŞ döwletlere täze bir data setini gurýarys. Çarplar, meýilleşdiriler, kanunlar we pul donörlary bilen birnäçe çeşme çeşmelerini çarpýar. Indiki, durum hatlaryny dahyl etmek we çözümlenmek üçin tekst grafynda tabanly bir nusga döredik. Biziň nusgamyz ýe ňiji/ýitirçiligimizi çaklaýar we soňra ony kanunladyň bedeniň sesini demografik/ideolojik kriteriýa g örä çykarmak üçin gowy ulanýar.', 'fa': 'تصمیم\u200cها در سیاست\u200cهای سطح دولتی اثر عمیقی بر بسیاری از نقطه\u200cهای زندگی روزمون دارند، مثل دسترسی به مراقبت سلامتی و آموزش. ولی درک کمی از این سیاست و تصمیم\u200cها در روش قانونی وجود دارد. ما با تأثیر قانون بر گروهی مشترک (مثلاً معلم\u200cها در حقوق آموزش) یک دستور به راهنمایی داده می\u200cگیریم تا درک فرایند تصمیم گرفتن و رای دادن قوانین را بفهمند. ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید برای کشورهای متعدد آمریکا ساختیم که منبع متعدد اطلاعات را می\u200cارتباط می\u200cکند، شامل حقوق، مشترک\u200cکنندگان، قانون\u200cدهندگان و donators پول. بعدش، ما یک مدل بر اساس گراف متن را توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا حساب\u200cهای وضعیت را وارد و تحلیل کنیم. مدل ما برنده\u200cها/بازنده\u200cها حقوق را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند و سپس آنها را استفاده می\u200cکند تا بهتر تعریف رای بدن قانونی بر اساس مقررات دموگرافیک/ایده\u200cشناسی، مثلا جنسی را تعریف کند.', 'sq': 'Vendimet mbi politikat në nivel shtetëror kanë një ndikim të thellë në shumë aspekte të jetës sonë të përditshme, të tilla si kujdesi shëndetësor dhe aksesi në arsim. Megjithatë, nuk ka shumë kuptim se si këto politika dhe vendime po formohen në procesin legjislativ. Ne marrim një qasje të mbështetur në të dhëna duke dekodifikuar ndikimin e legjislacionit mbi palët e duhura (për shembull mësuesit në projekt-ligjet arsimore) për të kuptuar procesin e vendimit të legjislaturëve dhe votat. We build a new dataset for multiple US states that interconnects multiple sources of data including bills, stakeholders, legislators, and money donors.  Pastaj, ne zhvillojmë një model tekstual bazuar në grafik për të përfshirë dhe analizuar faturat shtetërore. Modeli ynë parashikon fituesit/humbësit e projekt-ligjeve dhe pastaj i përdor ato për të përcaktuar më mirë ndarjen e votave të korpit legjislativ sipas kritereve demografike/ideologjike, për shembull gjini.', 'am': 'Decisions on state-level policies have a deep effect on many aspects of our everyday life, such as health-care and education access.   ነገር ግን እነዚህ ፖለቲያዎች የሕግ ጉዳይ እንዴት እንደተፈጠሩ ማስተዋል ጥቂት ነው፡፡ የሕግ ሥርዓትና ድምፅ የሕግ መብትን እናስተውል ዘንድ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ አዲስ የአሜሪካ ሀገራት አዲስ ዳታተር መሥራት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሚቀጥለውን የሥርዓት ደብዳቤዎችን ለመፍጠር እና ለማስተዋል የጽሑፍ ቀለም ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ምሳሌያችን የሕግ አካል ድምፅ መፍረስ እንዲሻል፣ የህግ አካል ድምፅ ለመፍጠር፣ የዲሞፖርቲካ/የአሳባቢ ክፍሎች፣ ለምሳሌ የሴት ውይይት ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Նահանգային մակարդակի քաղաքականության որոշումները խորը ազդեցություն ունեն մեր առօրյա կյանքի բազմաթիվ ասպեկտների վրա, ինչպիսիք են առողջապահությունը և կրթությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, չկա շատ հասկացություն, թե ինչպես են այս քաղաքականությունները և որոշումները ձևավորվում օրենսդրական գործընթացում: We take a data-driven approach by decoding the impact of legislation on relevant stakeholders (e.g., teachers in education bills) to understand legislators' decision-making process and votes.  Մենք ստեղծում ենք մի նոր տվյալների համակարգ բազմաթիվ ԱՄՆ երկրների համար, որը փոխկապակցնում է տվյալների բազմաթիվ աղբյուրներ, ներառյալ հաշվարկներ, հետաքրքրված մասնավորներ, օրենսդրողներ և փողի Հաջորդ, մենք ստեղծում ենք գրաֆիկական մոդել, որը ներառում և վերլուծում է պետական հաշվարկները: Մեր մոդելը կանխատեսում է ծրագրերի հաղթերին ու կորցներին և հետո օգտագործում է դրանք ավելի լավ որոշելու համար օրենսդրական մարմնի քվեի բաժանման համաձայն ժողովրդագրական և գաղափարաբանական հանգամանքներին, օրինակ սեռը:", 'az': 'Eyalet seviyyəti siyasətlərə dair kararlar günlük həyatımızın çoxlu aspektlərinə, sağlamlıq təhsil və təhsil müvəffəqiyyətinə bənzəyir. Lakin bu politikalar və kararlar legislaşdırma sürecində necə yaradılır? Biz məlumatların hökmünü və səslərini anlamaq üçün məlumatların təsirlərinin dəyişdirilməsini (məsələn, təhsil hesablarında müəllimlərin təsirlərinin dəyişdirilməsi üçün məlumatların təsirlərini dəyişdirən tərzini alırıq. Biz çoxlu ABŞ eyaletində yeni verilən qurğu inşa edirik ki, hesablar, müasir sahibləri, legislatörlər və pul donörləri içərisində çoxlu məlumat kaynaqlarını bağlayır. Sonradan, durum hesablarını inşa etmək və analiz etmək üçün textual graf tabanlı modeli inşa edirik. Bizim modellərimiz qələbələrimizi/hesab çəkənləri təmin edir və sonra onları daha yaxşı təyin edir, demografik/ideolojik kriteriyətlərə g örə, cins s əsini daha yaxşı təyin etmək üçün istifadə edir.', 'bn': 'রাষ্ট্রীয় পর্যায়ের নীতি নিয়ে সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়েছে আমাদের প্রতিদিনের জীবনের অনেক প্রভাবের উপর, যেমন স্বাস্থ্য সেবা এব তবে আইন প্রক্রিয়ায় এই নীতি এবং সিদ্ধান্ত কিভাবে গঠন করা হচ্ছে তা বুঝতে পারে না। আইনের সিদ্ধান্ত নির্বাচন ও ভোট বুঝতে পারার জন্য আমরা বিভিন্ন সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ে আইনের প্রভাব কমিয়ে দিয়েছি। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি আমেরিকার রাষ্ট্রের জন্য একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট তৈরি করি যা বিল, স্টেকহোল্ডার, আইনী এবং টাকা দাতাদের মধ্যে বেশ কিছু ত পরবর্তীতে, আমরা একটি টেক্সচুয়াল গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক মডেল তৈরি করি রাষ্ট্রীয় বিল বিশ্লেষণের জন্য। আমাদের মডেল ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে বিলের বিজয়ী/হারিয়েছে এবং তারপর তাদের ব্যবহার করে আইনী শরীরের ভোটের ভোট ভাঙ্গা নির্ধারণের জন্যে ভালো করে দেয়, যেমন ল', 'ca': "Les decisions sobre les polítiques a nivell estatal tenen un efecte profund en molts aspectes de la nostra vida quotidiana, com la sanitat i l'accés a l'educació. However, there is little understanding of how these policies and decisions are being formed in the legislative process.  We take a data-driven approach by decoding the impact of legislation on relevant stakeholders (e.g., teachers in education bills) to understand legislators' decision-making process and votes.  Construim un nou conjunt de dades per a múltiples estats nord-americans que interconnecten múltiples fonts de dades, incloent les lleis, les partes interessats, els legisladors i donants de diners. Després, desenvolupem un model basat en un gràfic textual per incorporar i analitzar factures estatals. El nostre model prediu els guanyadors/perdedors de lleis i els utilitza per determinar millor la divisió de vots del cos legislatiu segons criteris demogràfics/ideològics, per exemple g ènere.", 'cs': 'Rozhodnutí o politikách na státní úrovni mají hluboký vliv na mnoho aspektů našeho každodenního života, jako je zdravotní péče a přístup ke vzdělávání. Nicméně není pochopeno, jak se tyto politiky a rozhodnutí formují v legislativním procesu. Používáme přístup založený na datech tím, že dekódujeme dopad legislativy na relevantní zúčastněné strany (např. učitele v zákonech o vzdělávání), abychom porozuměli rozhodovacímu procesu a hlasování zákonodárců. Vytváříme nový datový soubor pro více států USA, který propojuje více zdrojů dat, včetně účtů, zúčastněných stran, zákonodárců a dárců peněz. Dále vyvíjíme textový grafový model pro vložení a analýzu státních účtů. Náš model předpovídá vítěze/poražené zákonů a následně je využívá k lepšímu určení členění hlasů legislativního orgánu podle demografických/ideologických kritérií, např. pohlaví.', 'bs': 'Odluke o politikama na državnom nivou imaju duboko uticaj na mnoge aspekte našeg svakodnevnog života, poput pristupa zdravstvenom skrbi i obrazovanja. Međutim, malo razumijeva kako se te politike i odluke formiraju u zakonodavnom procesu. Prihvaćamo podatkovni pristup dekodiranjem utjecaja zakonodavstva na odgovarajuće dionice (npr. nastavnici u obrazovnim računima) kako bi razumjeli proces donošenja odluka i glasanja zakonodavstva. Napravili smo novi set podataka za višestruke američke države koje međusobno povezuju višestruke izvore podataka uključujući račune, dionice, zakonodavce i donatore novca. Sljedeće, razvijamo tekstualni model na grafiku kako bi uključili i analizirali državne račune. Naš model predviđa pobjednike/gubitnike računa i onda ih koristi kako bi bolje utvrdilo raskidanje glasova zakonodavnog tijela u skladu s demografskim/ideološkim kriterijama, npr. spol.', 'et': 'Otsused riigi tasandi poliitika kohta avaldavad sügavat mõju meie igapäevaelu paljudele aspektidele, näiteks tervishoiule ja haridusele juurdepääsule. Siiski on vähe arusaamist sellest, kuidas neid poliitikaid ja otsuseid seadusandlikus protsessis kujundatakse. Me kasutame andmepõhist lähenemisviisi, dekodeerides õigusaktide mõju asjaomastele sidusrühmadele (nt õpetajad haridusseaduses), et mõista seadusandjate otsustusprotsessi ja hääletusi. Me loome mitme USA riigi jaoks uue andmekogumi, mis ühendab omavahel mitmeid andmeallikaid, sealhulgas arveid, sidusrühmi, seadusandjaid ja rahaandjaid. Seejärel töötame välja tekstigraafikutel põhineva mudeli riigieelnõude manustamiseks ja analüüsimiseks. Meie mudel prognoosib eelnõude võitjaid/kaotajaid ja kasutab neid seejärel seadusandliku organi häälte jaotuse paremaks määramiseks vastavalt demograafilistele/ideoloogilistele kriteeriumidele, nt soole.', 'fi': 'Valtiontason politiikkaa koskevilla päätöksillä on syvä vaikutus moniin arkielämän osa-alueisiin, kuten terveydenhoitoon ja koulutukseen. On kuitenkin vähän ymmärrystä siitä, miten näitä politiikkoja ja päätöksiä muodostetaan lainsäädäntöprosessissa. Noudatamme datalähtöistä lähestymistapaa purkamalla lainsäädännön vaikutukset asianomaisiin sidosryhmiin (esim. opettajat koulutuslakiehdotuksissa) ymmärtääksemme lainsäätäjien päätöksentekoprosessia ja äänestystä. Rakennamme useita Yhdysvaltain osavaltioita varten uuden datajoukon, joka yhdistää useita tietolähteitä, kuten laskuja, sidosryhmiä, lainsäätäjiä ja rahanluovuttajia. Seuraavaksi kehitämme tekstuaalisen graafisen mallin valtionlaskujen upottamiseen ja analysointiin. Mallimme ennustaa lakiehdotusten voittajia/häviäjiä ja käyttää niitä määrittääkseen paremmin lainsäädäntöelimen äänijakauman demografisten/ideologisten kriteerien, kuten sukupuolen, mukaan.', 'af': "Besluite op staatsvlak beleid het 'n diep effek op baie aspekte van ons elke dag lewe, soos gesondige sorg en opvoedkundige toegang. Maar daar is 'n bietjie verstanding van hoe hierdie beleid en besluite in die wetsproses geformeer word. Ons neem 'n data-bevestige toegang deur die bepaling van wetgewing te dekodeer op relevant e geweldige onderhouers (bv. onderwysers in onderwyselsregtings) om die besluit-proses en stemme van wetgewerkers te verstaan. Ons bou 'n nuwe datastel vir veelvuldige VSA staatste wat veelvuldige bronne van data, insluitend bills, staatshouers, wetslawers en geld donors verbind. Volgende, ons ontwikkel 'n tekstuele graafgebaseerde model om staatsbills te inbêer en analyseer. Ons model voorskou winners/verlorers van rekeninge en dan gebruik hulle om beter die wetliggaam s e stem afbreek te bepaal volgens demografiese/ideologiese kriteriërs, bv. gender.", 'ha': "Wasu'arin a kan siyafan-daraja na state sun yi amfani ga masu yawa na masu cikin rãyuwarmu a yiwuni, kamar ruwan zartar da afya da education. ... Amma, bã za ta fahimta ba yadda za'a danne waɗannan siyafa da go'anar sharci. Tuna karɓi wani takwara da aka yi tafiyar da data da za'a kodi musamman sharciyar da masu husuda (misali, musamman masu bin elimu) dõmin su fahimta jarrabar masu yin hukunci da kura na sharciyar. Tuna samar da wani tsari na jama'a-jama'a masu yawa na kasa haɗi Source na data masu yawa, kamar misãlai, mataimaki, sharciyar da mataimaki. Na ƙara, muna buɗe wata misali mai fassara na rubutu dõmin a shigar da shi kuma mu yi anarari musuluntan halin. MisalinMu na buga mataimaki/hasara na musamman, kuma yana amfani da su dõmin ya fi canza su ƙayyade tunkuɗe wa misãlani da misãlan jini.", 'jv': 'Léwisan kanggo kalawarta-sistem sing gak bener tentang kanggo kalawarta ning awak dhéwé, kaya ngono kaleh-kaleh lan akses edukasi. Nanging, ora ono bebah mengko perusahaan ning piye perasaane politik lan disimperasyon iki bakal kelakon ning perusahaan hukum sing dikarepaké. Awak dhéwé éntuk data-kondho nggawe barang nggawe aturan aturan sing perusahaan kanggo nggawe aturan sing perusahaan kanggo sabên gerakan (bisa, guru-guru kelas ning acara awak dhéwé) kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan winih kanggo nguasai perusahaan hukum sing beraksi lan mbu Awak dhéwé nggawe data set nggawe kanggo sistem sing dibutung kanggo langgar-sistem dadi iki dadi sing nyeangno karo bilgi, stakekarno, lawasno karo dolar-dolar Next > model dhéwé énhadi perbudhakan/iso nggolok barang nggawe lan ijol-ijol kuwi nggawe ngubah bener nggawe barang-ijolan winih lawasno sing berarti cara-ijol sing berarti diputara temèh daemongké (sing paling-ijol), sing berarti barêng-ijol.', 'sk': 'Odločitve o politikah na državni ravni globoko vplivajo na številne vidike našega vsakdanjega življenja, kot sta dostop do zdravstvenega varstva in izobraževanja. Vendar pa se malo razume, kako se te politike in odločitve oblikujejo v zakonodajnem postopku. Za razumevanje procesa odločanja in glasovanja zakonodajalcev upoštevamo podatkovno usmerjen pristop z dekodiranjem vpliva zakonodaje na ustrezne deležnike (npr. učitelje v zakonodajnih zakonodajah). Za več držav ZDA zgradimo nov nabor podatkov, ki medsebojno povezuje več virov podatkov, vključno z računi, deležniki, zakonodajalci in donatorji denarja. Nato smo razvili besedilni grafski model za vgradnjo in analizo državnih zakonov. Naš model napoveduje zmagovalce/poražence zakonov in jih nato uporablja za boljšo določitev razčlenitve glasov zakonodajnega organa glede na demografske/ideološke kriterije, npr. spol.', 'he': 'ההחלטות על מדיניות רמה של מדינה יש השפעה עמוקה על היבטים רבים של חיינו היומיים, כמו טיפול בריאות וחינוך גישה. עם זאת, יש מעט הבנה איך המדיניות וההחלטות האלה נוצרות בתהליך החוק. אנו לוקחים גישה מונעת מידע על ידי לפענח את ההשפעה של החוק על עניינים רלוונטיים (למשל מורים בחשבונות חינוך) כדי להבין את תהליך החלטה של החוקים והקולות. אנחנו בונים קבוצת נתונים חדשה למדינות ארה"ב רבות שמקשרות בין מקורות רבים של נתונים כולל חשבונות, מעוניינים, חוקים, תורמים כסף. לאחר מכן, אנחנו מפתחים מודל טקסטולי מבוסס בגרף כדי להכניס ולניתוח חשבונות מדינות. Our model predicts winners/losers of bills and then utilizes them to better determine the legislative body\'s vote breakdown according to demographic/ideological criteria, e.g., gender.', 'bo': "གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འཆར་གཞིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་མི་ཚེ་གང་ཟག་གཞན་ཞིག་ནང་གི་ཉིན་ཁ་ཡུལ་ཤིག་སྐྱོང་ནི་ ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆབ་སྲིད་དང་གདམ་འབེབས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཇི་ལྟར་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་འདུག། We take a data-driven approach by decoding the impact of legislation on relevant stakeholders (e.g. teachers in education bills) to understand legislators' decision-making process and votes. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་གཙོ་རིམ་དང་། ལས་འགུལ་ཆས། ཁུངས་སྤྲོད་པ་དང་། སྲིད་དཔུད་པ་དང་། མི་དངུལ་སྤྲོད་ཆས་མཁན འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནང་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་ཞིག་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་དང་བསླབ་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་བྱེད་མཁན་དག་རྒྱུ་དང་། དེ་ནས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀྱང་སྲིད་གཞུང་གི་དབུགས་ཀྱི་གདམ་ཁ་གཏོང་རྩ"}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'التوصيف الهيكلي لفك تشابك الحوار', 'fr': 'Caractérisation structurale pour le démêlage du dialogue', 'es': 'Caracterización estructural para el desentrañamiento del diálogo', 'pt': 'Caracterização Estrutural para Desembaraçar Diálogos', 'ja': 'ダイアログ切断の構造的特徴付け', 'zh': '对话解缠结构表徵', 'hi': 'संवाद विघटन के लिए संरचनात्मक लक्षण वर्णन', 'ru': 'Структурная характеристика для разделения диалога', 'ga': 'Tréithriú Struchtúrtha do Dhícheangal Idirphlé', 'ka': 'დიალოგის დაკავშირება', 'hu': 'Strukturális jellemzők a párbeszéd eltávolításához', 'el': 'Δομικός χαρακτηρισμός για τη διάσπαση διαλόγου', 'it': 'Caratterizzazione strutturale per lo sconvolgimento del dialogo', 'kk': 'Диалогты шектеу үшін структуралы таңдау', 'lt': 'Structural Characterization for Dialogue Disentanglement', 'mk': 'Структурна карактеризација за раздвојување на дијалогот', 'mt': 'Karatterizzazzjoni Strutturali għad-Diżanċjar tad-Djalogu', 'ms': 'Aksara Struktur untuk Penghapusan Dialog', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് ഡിസ്റ്റെന്റ്മെന്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ക്രമീകരണം', 'ro': 'Caracterizare structurală pentru dezimplicarea dialogului', 'no': 'Strukturisk teikning for dialogutstyring', 'pl': 'Charakteryzacja strukturalna dla rozdzielania dialogu', 'mn': 'Диалог Сүйтгэл хөдлөлийн бүтэц', 'si': 'සංවාදය අවස්ථානය සඳහා සංවාදය සංවිධානය සංවිධානය සංවිධානය', 'so': 'Isticmaalka dhaqanka ee u baaraandegista dialogue', 'sv': 'Strukturell karakterisering för dialog Disentanglement', 'sr': 'Strukturalna karakterizacija za razaranje dijaloga', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் மாற்றுதலுக்கான கட்டுப்பாட்டு எழுத்துருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'ڈالیلوگ ڈیلنٹ ڈیلنگل کے لئے ساختاری تعریف', 'uz': 'Structural Characterization for Dialogue Disentanglement', 'vi': 'Thành phần cấu trúc Đối tượng Gặp gỡ', 'bg': 'Структурна характеристика за разделяне на диалога', 'da': 'Strukturel karakterisering for dialog Disentanglement', 'nl': 'Structurele karakterisering voor dialoogverbreking', 'hr': 'Strukturalna karakterizacija za razaranje dijaloga', 'de': 'Strukturelle Charakterisierung für Dialogtrennung', 'id': 'Karakterisasi Struktur untuk Disentanglement Dialog', 'ko': '대화 해구의 구조적 표징', 'fa': 'شخصیت ساختاری برای تغییر دادن محاورۀ دیوار', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Mfumo wa Kuzungumzia Dialogu', 'tr': 'Dälog Azyklamak üçin struktural Karakterlemek', 'af': 'Struktuurale karakterisering vir Dialoog Onderhouding', 'sq': 'Karakterizimi strukturor për zhvendosjen e dialogut', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'hy': 'Պատուհանի խառնաշփոթման կառուցվածքային հատկությունը', 'az': 'Dialoog 칞톛kilm톛si 칲칞칲n strukturlu Karakterizasyon', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ বিন্যাসের জন্য কৌশল ক্যান্ট্রাক্টারেশন', 'bs': 'Strukturalna karakterizacija za razaranje dijaloga', 'cs': 'Strukturální charakterizace pro rozdělení dialogů', 'et': 'Dialoogi lahutamise struktuuriline iseloomustus', 'ca': 'Característica estructural del desenvolupament del diàleg', 'fi': 'Dialogin hajaantumisen rakenteelliset ominaisuudet', 'jv': 'structural', 'sk': 'Strukturna značilnost razpletenosti dialoga', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག་སྒྲིག་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འབྲི་བ', 'he': 'אופיינת מבנה עבור התפרצות הדיולוגים'}
{'en': 'Interactive neural machine translation (INMT) is able to guarantee high-quality translations by taking human interactions into account. Existing IMT systems relying on lexical constrained decoding (LCD) enable humans to translate in a flexible translation order beyond the left-to-right. However, they typically suffer from two significant limitations in translation efficiency and quality due to the reliance on LCD. In this work, we propose a novel BiTIIMT system, Bilingual Text-Infilling for Interactive Neural Machine Translation. The key idea to BiTIIMT is Bilingual Text-infilling (BiTI) which aims to fill missing segments in a manually revised translation for a given source sentence. We propose a simple yet effective solution by casting this task as a sequence-to-sequence task. In this way, our system performs decoding without explicit constraints and makes full use of revised words for better translation prediction. Experiment results show that BiTiIMT performs significantly better and faster than state-of-the-art LCD-based IMT on three translation tasks.', 'ar': 'تؤدي سياقات الحوار المتعدد الأطراف المتشابكة إلى تحديات لفهم قراءة الحوار ، حيث تتدفق خيوط الحوار المتعددة في وقت واحد ضمن سجل حوار مشترك ، مما يزيد من الصعوبات في فهم تاريخ الحوار لكل من الإنسان والآلة.\nتركز الدراسات السابقة بشكل أساسي على طرق تشفير الكلام مع ميزات مصممة بعناية ولكن لا تولي اهتمامًا كافيًا للسمات المميزة لهيكل الحوارات. نأخذ في الاعتبار عوامل الهيكل بشكل خاص ونصمم نموذجًا جديدًا لفك تشابك الحوار. استنادًا إلى حقيقة أن الحوارات مبنية على المشاركة والتفاعلات المتتالية بين المتحدثين ، نقوم بنمذجة المعلومات الهيكلية للحوارات في جانبين: 1) خاصية المتحدث التي تشير إلى من تأتي الرسالة ، و 2) التبعية المرجعية التي توضح من قد تشير الرسالة ل. الطريقة المقترحة تحقق أحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية في مجموعة بيانات معيار Ubuntu IRC وتساهم في الفهم المرتبط بالحوار.', 'es': 'Los contextos de diálogo multipartidista enredados conducen a desafíos para la comprensión lectora por diálogo, donde múltiples hilos de diálogo fluyen simultáneamente dentro de un registro de diálogo común, lo que aumenta las dificultades para comprender la historia del diálogo tanto para humanos como para máquinas. \nLos estudios anteriores se centran principalmente en métodos de codificación de enunciados con características cuidadosamente diseñadas, pero no prestan suficiente atención a las características de la estructura de los diálogos. Tomamos especialmente en cuenta los factores de estructura y diseñamos un modelo novedoso para desenredar el diálogo. Basándonos en el hecho de que los diálogos se construyen sobre la participación e interacciones sucesivas entre oradores, modelamos la información estructural de los diálogos en dos aspectos: 1) propiedad del orador que indica de quién proviene un mensaje y 2) dependencia de referencia que muestra a quién puede referirse un mensaje. El método propuesto logra nuevos avances en el conjunto de datos de referencia de IRC de Ubuntu y contribuye a la comprensión relacionada con el diálogo.', 'fr': "Les contextes de dialogue multipartites enchevêtrés créent des défis pour la compréhension de la lecture des dialogues, où plusieurs fils de dialogue circulent simultanément dans un enregistrement de dialogue commun, ce qui augmente les difficultés à comprendre l'historique des dialogues, tant pour l'homme que pour la machine. \nLes études précédentes se concentrent principalement sur les méthodes de codage des énoncés avec des caractéristiques soigneusement conçues, mais n'accordent pas suffisamment d'attention aux caractéristiques de la structure des dialogues. Nous prenons particulièrement en compte les facteurs de structure et concevons un nouveau modèle de démêlage des dialogues. En nous basant sur le fait que les dialogues sont construits sur la participation et les interactions successives entre les intervenants, nous modélisons les informations structurelles des dialogues sous deux aspects\xa0: 1) la propriété du locuteur qui indique de qui provient un message, et 2) la dépendance de référence qui montre à qui un message peut faire référence. La méthode proposée atteint de nouvelles avancées sur l'ensemble de données de référence IRC Ubuntu et contribue à la compréhension liée au dialogue.", 'pt': 'Contextos de diálogo multipartidário emaranhados levam a desafios para a compreensão da leitura do diálogo, onde vários segmentos de diálogo fluem simultaneamente dentro de um registro de diálogo comum, aumentando as dificuldades na compreensão do histórico do diálogo tanto para humanos quanto para máquinas.\nEstudos anteriores se concentram principalmente em métodos de codificação de enunciados com características cuidadosamente projetadas, mas prestam atenção inadequada às características da estrutura dos diálogos. Levamos especialmente em consideração os fatores de estrutura e projetamos um novo modelo para desembaraçar o diálogo. Com base no fato de que os diálogos são construídos em sucessivas participações e interações entre os falantes, modelamos as informações estruturais dos diálogos em dois aspectos: 1) propriedade do falante que indica de quem é a mensagem e 2) dependência de referência que mostra a quem uma mensagem pode se referir para. O método proposto alcança um novo estado da arte no conjunto de dados de benchmark Ubuntu IRC e contribui para a compreensão relacionada ao diálogo.', 'ja': '絡み合った複数当事者の対話文脈は、共通の対話記録内で複数の対話スレッドが同時に流れ、人間と機械の両方の対話履歴を理解することが困難になる、対話読解のための課題につながる。 \nこれまでの研究は、主に注意深く設計された特徴を持つ発話符号化方法に焦点を当てていたが、対話の構造の特徴には不十分な注意を払っていた。 構造因子を特に考慮し、対話解離のための斬新なモデルを設計します。 ダイアログが連続した参加とスピーカー間の相互作用に基づいて構築されているという事実に基づいて、私たちは、2つの側面でダイアログの構造情報をモデル化します。1 ）メッセージが誰からのものかを示すスピーカー特性、および2 ）メッセージが誰を指し得るかを示す参照依存性。 提案された方法は、Ubuntu IRCベンチマークデータセットの最先端を達成し、対話関連の理解に貢献します。', 'zh': '多方对语境读解挑战,其数线程同行,增解人机器之难。 \n前论主在精心设计语编码法,而于特征性不足。 我们特别思量了结构因缘,设了一种新颖的对话离模。 盖言者连与互动上之事,吾两建模之:1)言者性也,及2)见者引依赖性。 所立之法,于Ubuntu IRC准数集上成其最先进之术,而有助于言者。', 'hi': 'उलझे हुए बहु-पक्षीय संवाद संदर्भ संवाद पढ़ने की समझ के लिए चुनौतियों का कारण बनते हैं, जहां कई संवाद धागे एक सामान्य संवाद रिकॉर्ड के भीतर एक साथ प्रवाहित होते हैं, जिससे मानव और मशीन दोनों के लिए संवाद इतिहास को समझने में कठिनाइयां बढ़ जाती हैं। \nपिछले अध्ययन मुख्य रूप से ध्यान से डिज़ाइन की गई सुविधाओं के साथ उच्चारण एन्कोडिंग विधियों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, लेकिन संवादों की संरचना की विशेषता विशेषताओं पर अपर्याप्त ध्यान देते हैं। हम विशेष रूप से संरचना कारकों को ध्यान में रखते हैं और संवाद के लिए एक उपन्यास मॉडल डिजाइन करते हैं। इस तथ्य के आधार पर कि संवादों का निर्माण वक्ताओं के बीच क्रमिक भागीदारी और बातचीत पर किया जाता है, हम दो पहलुओं में संवादों की संरचनात्मक जानकारी को मॉडल करते हैं: 1) स्पीकर संपत्ति जो इंगित करती है कि एक संदेश किसका है, और 2) संदर्भ निर्भरता जो दिखाती है कि एक संदेश किसका उल्लेख कर सकता है। प्रस्तावित विधि उबंटू आईआरसी बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर नए अत्याधुनिक को प्राप्त करती है और संवाद से संबंधित समझ में योगदान देती है।', 'ru': 'Запутанные контексты многопартийного диалога приводят к вызовам для понимания чтения диалога, где несколько нитей диалога протекают одновременно в рамках общей записи диалога, увеличивая трудности в понимании истории диалога как для человека, так и для машины. \nПредыдущие исследования в основном сосредоточены на методах кодирования высказываний с тщательно проработанными признаками, но не уделяют должного внимания характерным признакам структуры диалогов. Мы специально учитываем структурные факторы и разрабатываем новую модель распутывания диалога. Основываясь на том, что диалоги построены на последовательном участии и взаимодействии между говорящими, мы моделируем структурную информацию диалогов в двух аспектах: 1) свойство спикера, указывающее, от кого происходит сообщение, и 2) эталонная зависимость, показывающая, на кого может ссылаться сообщение. Предлагаемый метод обеспечивает достижение нового уровня в базовом наборе данных Ubuntu IRC и способствует пониманию диалога.', 'ga': 'Cruthaíonn comhthéacsanna idirphlé ilpháirtí tangled dúshláin don léamhthuiscint idirphlé, áit a sreabhann snáitheanna iolracha comhphlé go comhuaineach laistigh de thaifead comhphlé comónta, rud a mhéadaíonn deacrachtaí maidir le tuiscint a fháil ar stair an chomhphlé don duine agus don mheaisín araon.\nDíríonn staidéir roimhe seo go príomha ar mhodhanna ionchódaithe cainte le gnéithe deartha go cúramach ach ní thugtar aird leordhóthanach ar shainghnéithe struchtúr na gcomhphlé. Cuirimid fachtóirí struchtúir san áireamh go speisialta agus dearadh múnla nua le haghaidh dícheangal idirphlé. Bunaithe ar an bhfíric go dtógtar idirphlé ar rannpháirtíocht chomhleanúnach agus ar idirghníomhaíochtaí idir cainteoirí, déanaimid múnla struchtúrach ar chomhphlé i dhá ghné: 1) maoin an chainteora a chuireann in iúl cé as an teachtaireacht, agus 2) spleáchas tagartha a thaispeánann cé dó a fhéadfaidh teachtaireacht tagairt a dhéanamh. chun. Baineann an modh molta amach úrscothach ar thacar sonraí tagarmhairc Ubuntu IRC agus cuireann sé le tuiscint a bhaineann le hidirphlé.', 'hu': 'Az összezavarodott többpártos párbeszéd kontextusok kihívásokat jelentenek a párbeszéd olvasásának megértése szempontjából, ahol több párbeszédszál folyik egyidejűleg egy közös párbeszédrekordon belül, ami növeli a párbeszédtörténet megértésének nehézségeit mind az ember, mind a gép számára.', 'el': 'Τα μπερδεμένα πλαίσια διαλόγου πολλών κομμάτων οδηγούν σε προκλήσεις για την κατανόηση της ανάγνωσης του διαλόγου, όπου πολλαπλά νήματα διαλόγου ρέουν ταυτόχρονα μέσα σε ένα κοινό αρχείο διαλόγου, αυξάνοντας τις δυσκολίες στην κατανόηση της ιστορίας του διαλόγου τόσο για τον άνθρωπο όσο και για τη μηχανή.', 'ka': 'რანგლირებული მრავალფორტის დიალოგის კონტექსტები იქნება დიალოგის კითხვის შეცდომა, სადაც მრავალფერი დიალოგის კონტექსტები ერთადერთი დიალოგის რეკონტებში გადარწმუნდება, მხოლოდ ადამია', 'it': "Contesti di dialogo multi-partito aggrovigliati portano a sfide per la comprensione della lettura del dialogo, in cui più fili di dialogo scorrono simultaneamente all'interno di un record di dialogo comune, aumentando le difficoltà nella comprensione della storia del dialogo sia per l'uomo che per la macchina.", 'kk': 'Бірнеше партиялық диалог контекстері диалогты оқу үшін бірнеше диалогтың ілеспелерін түсініктемелеріне көмектеседі. Бірнеше диалогтың ілеспелері жалпы диалогтың жазуында, адамдар мен компьютер диалогтың журнал', 'lt': 'Tangled multi-party dialogue contexts lead to challenges for dialogue reading comprehension, where multiple dialogue threads flow simultaneously within a common dialogue record, increasing difficulties in understanding the dialogue history for both human and machine.', 'mk': 'Тенглираните мултипартиски дијалошки контексти водат до предизвици за разбирање на дијалогот за читање, каде што многуте дијалошки жици истовремено протекуваат во рамките на заедничкиот дијалог рекорд, зголемувајќи ги тешкотиите во разбирањето на историјата на дија', 'ms': 'Konteks dialog berbilang-parti berfungsi membawa kepada cabaran untuk pemahaman pembacaan dialog, di mana benang dialog berbilang mengalir secara bersamaan dalam rekod dialog umum, meningkatkan kesulitan dalam memahami sejarah dialog untuk manusia dan mesin.', 'mt': 'Kuntest ta’ djalogu b’diversi partijiet ikkontrollat iwassal għal sfidi għall-fehim tal-qari tad-djalogu, fejn diversi ħjut ta’ djalogu jgħaddu simultanjament fi ħdan rekord ta’ djalogu komuni, li jżidu d-diffikultajiet fil-fehim tal-istorja tad-djalogu kemm għall-bniedem kif ukoll għall-magna.', 'ml': 'ടാങ്കിള്\u200d ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്ന പല പാര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ഡയലോഗ് ഡയലോഗ് വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ ഒരു സാധാരണ ഡയലോഗ', 'no': 'Med dialogvindauget for fleire partir blir brukt utfordringar for å lesa forståelse i dialogen, der fleire dialogtrådar flyttar samtidig i eit felles dialogoppføring, og øker vanskeleghetar for å forstå dialoghistorien for både menneske og maskina.', 'pl': 'Zaplątane konteksty dialogu wielostronnego prowadzą do wyzwań dotyczących rozumienia dialogu, gdzie wiele wątków dialogu płynie jednocześnie w ramach wspólnego rekordu dialogu, zwiększając trudności w zrozumieniu historii dialogu zarówno dla ludzi, jak i maszyny.', 'mn': 'Олон төрлийн диалогын тухай ярианы тухай ярианы унших ойлголтын сорилтууд нь олон диалог нь нийтлэг диалогын бичлэг дотор холбоотой, хүн болон машины диалогын түүхийн тухай ойлгох хэцүү зүйлсийг нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'ro': 'Contextele încurcate de dialog multi-partid duc la provocări pentru înțelegerea lecturii dialogului, în care mai multe fire de dialog curg simultan într-o înregistrare comună de dialog, crescând dificultățile în înțelegerea istoriei dialogului atât pentru om, cât și pentru mașină.', 'sr': 'Uključeni konteksti multistranskih dijaloga dovede do izazova za čitanje dijaloga razumijevanja, gde višestruki dijalog trče istovremeno u zajedničkom dijalogu, povećavajući poteškoće u razumijevanju istorije dijaloga i ljudskih i strojeva.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් පාටි සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, මිනිස්සු සහ යන්ත්\u200dරය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාද සංවාද සංවා', 'so': 'Tangled multi-party dialogue contexts lead to challenges for dialogue reading comprehension, where multiple dialogue threads flow simultaneously within a common dialogue record, increasing difficulties in understanding the dialogue history for both human and machine.', 'sv': 'Trasslade flerpartsdialogkontexter leder till utmaningar för dialogläsförståelse, där flera dialogtrådar flödar samtidigt inom ett gemensamt dialogregister, vilket ökar svårigheterna att förstå dialoghistorien för både människa och maskin.', 'ta': 'Tangled multi-party dialogue contexts lead to challenges for dialogue reading comprehension, where multiple dialogue threads flow simultaneously within a common dialogue record, increasing difficulties in understanding the dialogue history for both human and machine.', 'ur': 'ٹانگل کئی پارٹی ڈیلوگو کے کنٹکس ڈیلوگو کو سمجھنے کے لئے چالیں پہنچاتے ہیں، جہاں بہت سی ڈیلوگو ٹریڈ ایک مشترک ڈیلوگو رکورد میں سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے سی', 'uz': "Koʻpchilik muloqat oynasi muloqat oynasida muloqat oynasi o'qish tuzuvni tahlil qiladi. Bu yerda muloqat oynasida bir nechta muloqat soʻzlari bir xil oyna sahifa orqali bir necha marta ajratiladi.", 'vi': 'Quan hệ đối thoại đa đảng gắn kết dẫn đến những thử thách cho sự thấu hiểu ngôn ngữ, nơi nhiều mối liên kết đối thoại chảy ra đồng thời trong một kỷ lục đối thoại chung, khiến khó hiểu về lịch sử đối thoại của con người và máy móc.', 'de': 'Verwirrte mehrseitige Dialogkontexte führen zu Herausforderungen für das Verständnis des Dialoglesens, bei dem mehrere Dialogfäden gleichzeitig innerhalb einer gemeinsamen Dialogaufzeichnung fließen, was zu zunehmenden Schwierigkeiten beim Verständnis der Dialoggeschichte für Mensch und Maschine führt. Bisherige Studien konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf Äußerungskodierungsmethoden mit sorgfältig gestalteten Merkmalen, achten jedoch nicht auf charakteristische Merkmale der Dialogstruktur. Wir berücksichtigen insbesondere Strukturfaktoren und entwerfen ein neuartiges Modell zur Dialogentkoppelung. Basierend auf der Tatsache, dass Dialoge auf aufeinanderfolgender Beteiligung und Interaktionen zwischen Sprechern aufgebaut sind, modellieren wir strukturelle Informationen von Dialogen in zwei Aspekten: 1)speaker Eigenschaft, die angibt, von wem eine Nachricht stammt, und 2) Referenzabhängigkeit, die zeigt, auf wen sich eine Nachricht beziehen darf. Die vorgeschlagene Methode erreicht einen neuen Stand der Technik auf dem Ubuntu IRC Benchmark Dataset und trägt zum dialogbezogenen Verständnis bei.', 'hr': 'Razmišljaju o razumijevanju dijaloga s mnogim stranama, gdje su višestruki dijalogski trci istovremeno tijekom zajedničkog dijaloga, povećavajući poteškoća u razumijevanju povijesti dijaloga i ljudskih i strojeva. Prije ispitivanja se uglavnom fokusiraju na metode kodiranja izraza s pažljivo dizajniranim karakteristikama, ali obraćaju nedovoljnu pažnju na karakteristične karakteristike strukture dijalogova. Posebno uzimamo u obzir strukturne faktore i dizajniramo novi model za razmišljanje dijaloga. Na temelju činjenice da su dijalogi izgrađeni na posljednjem sudjelovanju i interakciji između govornika, modeliramo strukturne informacije o dijalogovima u dva aspekta: 1)vlasništvo govornika koji pokazuje odakle je poruka, a 2) referentna zavisnost koja pokazuje na koga se može odnijeti poruka. Predložena metoda postigne novo stanje umjetnosti na setu podataka o referenciji Ubuntu IRC-a i doprinosi razumijevanju povezanim s dijalogom.', 'bg': 'Заплетените многопартийни диалогови контексти водят до предизвикателства за разбирането на диалога, където множество диалогови нишки протичат едновременно в рамките на общ диалог запис, което увеличава трудностите в разбирането на историята на диалога както за човека, така и за машината. Предишните проучвания се фокусират основно върху методи за кодиране на речта с внимателно проектирани характеристики, но обръщат недостатъчно внимание на характерните особености на структурата на диалога. Специално вземаме под внимание структурните фактори и проектираме нов модел за разгадаване на диалога. Въз основа на факта, че диалозите са изградени на последователно участие и взаимодействия между говорителите, моделираме структурната информация на диалозите в два аспекта: 1) свойство на говорителя, което показва от кого е съобщението, и 2) зависимост от референцията, която показва към кого може да се отнася съобщението. Предложеният метод постига ново състояние на изкуството в сравнителния набор от данни за IRC на Ubuntu и допринася за разбирането, свързано с диалога.', 'id': 'Konteks dialog multi-partis yang ditangani membawa tantangan untuk pemahaman pembacaan dialog, di mana benang dialog berbilang mengalir secara bersamaan dalam catatan dialog umum, meningkatkan kesulitan dalam memahami sejarah dialog untuk manusia dan mesin. Studi sebelumnya terutama fokus pada metode pengekodan utterance dengan ciri-ciri yang direncanakan dengan hati-hati tetapi memperhatikan tidak cukup pada ciri-ciri karakteristik struktur dialog. Kami secara khusus mempertimbangkan faktor struktur dan merancang model baru untuk dialog disentangling. Berdasarkan fakta bahwa dialog dibangun pada partisipasi berturut-turut dan interaksi antara pembicara, kita model informasi struktur dialog dalam dua aspek: 1)properti pembicara yang menunjukkan dari siapa pesan berasal, dan 2) dependensi referensi yang menunjukkan kepada siapa pesan dapat merujuk. Metode yang diusulkan mencapai state-of-the-art baru pada set data benchmark IRC Ubuntu dan berkontribusi ke pemahaman berkaitan dengan dialog.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe-topar dialoglary çykyp bilmek üçin synaglary çykarýar, bu ýerde birnäçe dialogyň dinini hem adam we maşynyň dinini düşünmek üçin kynçylyklary çykar. Öňki araştyrmalar önündeki çykyş kodleme metodlaryna adatça tasarlanýan özellikler bilen fokus edýär ýöne dialoglaryň strukturyna ýeterlik üns ber. Biz adatça struktur faktörlerini hesap edip, dijalogy boýunça bir nusga düzenledik. Diýaloglaryň üstünlikli çykyşlyklar we çykyşlyklaryň arasynda ýakynlaşyk bilen in şa edilýän faktyna görä, biz iki aspektde dialoglaryň strukturlarynyň maglumatyny örän çykýarys: 1)sözler häsiýeti bu mesediň kimiň tarapyndan bolandygyny görkezýär, we 2) hatyň kime Öň teklip edilen yöntem Ubuntu IRC kriterçi maglumatynyň täze bir ýagtylygynyň durumyny ýetip edýär we mesele barada dialogdan düşünmesine kömekleyär.', 'sq': 'Kontekstet e dialogut shumepartik të tankuar çojnë në sfida për kuptimin e leximit të dialogut, ku vijat e dialogut të shumëfishtë rrjedhin njëkohësisht brenda një rekord të përbashkët dialogu, duke rritur vështirësitë në kuptimin e historisë së dialogut si për njerëzit ashtu edhe për makinën. Studimet e mëparshme përqëndrohen kryesisht në metodat e kodimit të shprehjeve me karakteristika të projektuara me kujdes por kushtojnë vëmendje të papërshtatshme ndaj karakteristikave të strukturës së dialogeve. We specially take structure factors into account and design a novel model for dialogue disentangling.  Duke u bazuar në faktin se dialoget janë ndërtuar në pjesëmarrjen e radhës dhe ndërveprimet midis folësve, ne modelojmë informacionin strukturor të dialogeve në dy aspekte: 1)pronë e folësit që tregon nga kush është një mesazh dhe 2) varësinë e referimit që tregon se kujt mund të referohet një mesazh. Metoda e propozuar arrin gjendjen e re të avancuar në bazën e të dhënave të IRC-së Ubuntu dhe kontribuon në kuptimin lidhur me dialogun.', 'nl': 'Verwisselde dialoogcontexten met meerdere partijen leiden tot uitdagingen voor het begrip van dialooglezen, waarbij meerdere dialoogdraden gelijktijdig stromen binnen een gemeenschappelijk dialoogrecord, waardoor het moeilijker wordt om de dialooggeschiedenis voor zowel mens als machine te begrijpen. Eerdere studies richten zich voornamelijk op uitingscodering methoden met zorgvuldig ontworpen kenmerken, maar besteden onvoldoende aandacht aan karakteristieke kenmerken van de structuur van dialogen. We houden speciaal rekening met structurele factoren en ontwerpen een nieuw model voor dialoogontkoppeling. Op basis van het feit dat dialogen zijn opgebouwd op opeenvolgende participatie en interacties tussen sprekers, modelleren we structurele informatie van dialogen in twee aspecten: 1)speaker eigenschap die aangeeft van wie een bericht afkomstig is, en 2) referentieafhankelijkheid die laat zien naar wie een bericht mag verwijzen. De voorgestelde methode bereikt nieuwe state-of-the-art op de Ubuntu IRC benchmark dataset en draagt bij aan dialooggerelateerd begrip.', 'da': 'Indviklede flerpartidialogsammenhænge fører til udfordringer for dialog læseforståelse, hvor flere dialogtråde flyder samtidig inden for en fælles dialog rekord, hvilket øger vanskelighederne med at forstå dialoghistorien for både menneske og maskine. Tidligere undersøgelser fokuserer hovedsageligt på ytringskodningsmetoder med omhyggeligt designede funktioner, men er utilstrækkelig opmærksomme på karakteristiske træk ved dialogstrukturen. Vi tager særligt højde for strukturfaktorer og designer en ny model til dialog adskillelse. Med udgangspunkt i, at dialoger er konstrueret på hinanden følgende deltagelse og interaktioner mellem talere, modellerer vi strukturelle oplysninger om dialoger i to aspekter: 1) taler egenskab, der angiver, hvem en besked kommer fra, og 2) referenceafhængighed, der viser, hvem en besked kan henvise til. Den foreslåede metode opnår nye state-of-the-art på Ubuntu IRC benchmark datasæt og bidrager til dialogrelateret forståelse.', 'fa': 'موضوع گفتگوی چندین حزب به چالش\u200cها برای خواندن گفتگو درک می\u200cکند، جایی که رشته\u200cهای متعدد گفتگو همزمان در یک ثبت گفتگوی مشترک روان می\u200cشوند، مشکلات افزایش در درک تاریخ گفتگوی برای انسان و ماشین است. مطالعات قبلی بیشتر روی روش\u200cهای رمزبندی سخنرانی با ویژه\u200cهای طراحی دقت تمرکز می\u200cکند ولی توجه به ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای ساختار دیalog\u200cها را به اندازه\u200cی کافی نداشته باشد. ما به طور مخصوصاً faktورهای ساختار را به حساب می گیریم و یک مدل رمانی برای ناخوشایند گفتگو طراحی می کنیم. بر اساس این حقیقت که گفتگوها روی مشارکت و تعاملات پیوسته بین صحبت کنندگان ساخته می شوند، ما اطلاعات ساختاری از گفتگوها در دو قسمت مدل می کنیم: 1)ویژگی صحبت کننده که نشان می دهد که یک پیغام از کجا است، و 2) بستگی تأخیر که نشان می دهد که یک پیغام به کجا می تواند ارائ این روش پیشنهاد به موقعیت جدید هنر روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای برچسب IRC اوبونتو رسیده و به درک رابطه با گفتگو کمک می\u200cکند.', 'am': 'የተመረጠው የብዙ ፓርቲ አካባቢ ማነሻ ጥቅምቶችን ለመያነብ አቀናቅሎ የሚያሳስል ጥቃቄ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት በተጨማሪው የንግግር የኮድ ማድረጊያውን በመጠቀም በጥንቃቄ ተጠቃሚ እና ግን የdialog አካባቢ ምርጫዎችን ለመጠቀም አይበቃቸውም፡፡ በተለየንም የመሠረተ ጉዳዮችን ለመቆጣጠር እና የመረጃ ምሳሌ ለጥያቄ ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተመሳሳይ እና በተቃዋሚዎች መካከል በተካሄደ ማኅበረሰብ እና ግንኙነት በመሠረቱ፣ የdialogue መልዕክት በሁለቱ ጉዳይ ላይ የምናስፈልገውን አስተካክል ማህበረሰብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በዑቡንቱ IRC benchmark dataset ላይ አዲስ የሥርዓት-አርእስት ያገኛል፡፡', 'sw': 'Mikongamano ya mazungumzo ya vyama vingi yanasababisha changamoto za kusoma ufahamu wa mazungumzo, ambapo matangazo mengi ya mazungumzo yanakwenda kwa wakati mmoja katika rekodi ya mazungumzo ya kawaida, inaongezea vigumu kuelewa historia ya mazungumzo kwa ajili ya binadamu na mashine. Utafiti uliopita umejikita hasa kwenye njia za рамзгузо maneno yenye vipengele vilivyoundwa vizuri lakini usijadili vifaa vya msingi wa muundo wa mazungumzo. Tunachukua viwanda vya miundombinu kuhakikisha na kutengeneza mtindo wa riwaya wa mazungumzo. Kutokana na ukweli kwamba mazungumzo yametengenezwa juu ya ushiriki wa mafanikio na mahusiano kati ya wazungumzaji, tunaweka mfano wa taarifa za mazungumzo katika vipande viwili: 1) mzungumzaji mali inayoonyesha ni nani ujumbe kutoka, na 2) kujitegemea na ujumbe unaoonyesha nani ujumbe unaweza kumaanisha. The proposed method achieves new state-of-the-art on the Ubuntu IRC benchmark dataset and contributes to dialogue-related comprehension.', 'af': "Tangleerde multi party dialoog kontekste lei na uitdagings vir dialoog lees verstanding, waar veelvuldige dialoog draad vloei samekoms binne 'n gemeenskaplike dialoog rekord, vermeerder moeilikheid in verstanding van die dialoog geskiedenis vir beide mense en masjien. Vorige studie fokus hoofsaaklik op uitdrukkingskodering metodes met versigtig ontwerp funksies, maar betaal onvoldoende aandag na karakteristiese funksies van die struktuur van dialoog. Ons neem spesiaal struktuur faktore in rekening en ontwerp 'n roman model vir dialoog wat onthou is. Basies op die feit dat dialoog op suksesvolle deelnadering en interaksie tussen sprekkers gebruik word, ons model strukturele inligting van dialoog in twee aspekte: 1)sprekker eienskap wat wys van wie 'n boodskap van is, en 2) verwysing afhanklikheid wat wys wie 'n boodskap kan verwys. Die voorgestelde metode bereik nuwe staat-van-kuns op die Ubuntu IRC-benchmark-datastel en bydra aan dialoog-verwante verstanding.", 'ko': '복잡한 다방면의 대화 환경은 대화의 읽기와 이해에 도전을 가져왔다. 하나의 공통된 대화 기록에서 여러 개의 대화 단서가 동시에 흐르면서 인류와 기계가 대화의 역사를 이해하는 어려움을 증가시켰다.이전의 연구는 주로 정성스럽게 디자인된 특징을 가진 언어 인코딩 방법에 집중되었지만 대화 구조의 특징에 대한 관심이 부족했다.우리는 특히 구조적 요소를 고려하여 새로운 대화 해구 모델을 설계했다.대화는 말하는 사람 간의 연속적인 참여와 상호작용을 바탕으로 이루어진 사실을 바탕으로 우리는 두 가지 측면에서 대화의 구조적 정보에 대해 모델링을 한다. 1) 말하는 사람의 속성은 메시지가 누구에게서 왔는지 표시하고, 2) 의존은 메시지가 누구를 가리키는지 참조한다.제시된 방법은 Ubuntu IRC 기준 데이터 세트에서 최신 수준을 구현해 대화 관련 이해에 도움이 된다.', 'hy': 'Բազմամասնությամբ խոսակցային կոնտեքստները հանգեցնում են խոսակցային ընթերցման մարտահրավերներին, որտեղ բազմամասնությամբ խոսակցային թելերը միաժամանակ հոսում են ընդհանուր խոսակցային արձանագրության մեջ, աճելով դժվարությունները մարդկային և մե Անցյալ ուսումնասիրությունները հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են արտահայտության կոդավորման մեթոդների վրա, որոնք ունեն ուշադիր ձևավորված հատկանիշներ, բայց բավականին ուշադրություն են դարձնում երկխուսերի կառուցվածքի հա Մենք հատկապես հաշվի առնում ենք կառուցվածքային գործոնները և նախագծում ենք մի նոր մոդել, որպեսզի երկխոսությունը բաժանվի: Հաշվի առնելով այն փաստին, որ խոսացողների միջև հաջորդ մասնակցության և փոխազդեցության վրա կառուցված են խոսակցությունները, մենք մոդելներ ենք կառուցվածքային տեղեկությունը խոսակցությունների երկու ասպեկտներում: 1) խոսացողի հատկությունը, որը ցույց է տալիս, թե որտեղից է հաղորդագր Առաջարկված մեթոդը հասնում է Ubuntu ինֆորմացիայի ինֆորմալ տվյալների համեմատային համակարգի նոր տեխնոլոգիաներին և աջակցում է դասախոսության հետ կապված հասկացության մեջ:', 'az': 'Çoxlu-parti diyalə müxtəlifləri diyalə oxumaq üçün çətinliklərə yol göstərir. Birçoxlu diyalə sözləri birlikdə ortaq diyalə rekordu içində istifadə edir, insanlar və maşınlar üçün diyalə keçmişini anlamaq üçün çətinlikləri artırar. Əvvəlki öyrənmələr çox çətinliklə müəyyən edilmiş xüsusiyyətlər ilə sözlər kodlama metodlarına odaqlanır, amma dialogların quruluşu xüsusiyyətlərinə yeterli dikkat verirlər. Biz xüsusiyyətli quruluş faktörlərini hesablayır və dijaloğu çəkmək üçün yeni modeli dizayn edirik. Söyləyənlər arasındakı müzakirə və müxtəlif məlumatlarda müzakirə edilənlərin əslində, iki aspektdə müzakirə məlumatlarının strukturlu məlumatlarını modelləyirik: 1) Önülləşdirilmiş metod Ubuntu IRC benchmark veri qutusunda yeni sanat qutusuna yetişər və dialogla bağlı anlama qutusuna kömək edir.', 'bs': 'Uključeni konteksti multistranskih dijaloga dovede do izazova za čitanje razumijevanja dijaloga, gdje višestruki dijalog trče istovremeno unutar zajedničkog dijaloga, povećavajući poteškoća u razumijevanju povijesti dijaloga i ljudskih i strojeva. Prije ispitivanja se uglavnom fokusiraju na metode kodiranja govora sa pažljivo dizajniranim karakteristikama, ali obraćaju nedovoljnu pažnju na karakteristične karakteristike strukture dijaloga. Posebno uzimamo u obzir strukturne faktore i dizajniramo novi model za odbacivanje dijaloga. Na temelju činjenice da su dijalogi izgrađeni na uspješnom sudjelovanju i interakciji između govornika, mi modeliramo strukturne informacije o dijalogima u dva aspekta: 1)vlasništvo govornika koji pokazuje odakle je poruka, i 2) referentna zavisnost koja pokazuje na koga se može odnijeti poruka. Predložena metoda postigne novu stanju umjetnosti na setu podataka o referenciji Ubuntu IRC-a i doprinosi razumijevanju povezanim s dijalogom.', 'cs': 'Zamotané dialogové kontexty více stran vedou k výzvám pro porozumění čtení dialogu, kde více dialogových vláken proudí současně v rámci společného dialogového záznamu, což zvyšuje obtíže v porozumění historii dialogu pro člověka i stroj. Předchozí studie se zaměřují především na metody kódování výrazů s pečlivě navrženými vlastnostmi, ale věnují nedostatečnou pozornost charakteristickým rysům struktury dialogů. Zvláště bereme v úvahu strukturní faktory a navrhujeme nový model pro rozpletení dialogu. Na základě skutečnosti, že dialogy jsou konstruovány na postupné účasti a interakcích mezi řečníky, modelujeme strukturální informace dialogů ve dvou aspektech: 1)vlastnost reproduktora, která označuje, od koho je zpráva, a 2) referenční závislost, která ukazuje, na koho může zpráva odkazovat. Navržená metoda dosahuje nových nejmodernějších datových sad Ubuntu IRC a přispívá k porozumění dialogu.', 'ca': "Els contextes de diàleg multipartit tancat porten a desafiaments per a la comprensió de la lectura del diàleg, on múltiples fils de diàleg flueixen simultàniament dins un registre de diàleg comú, creixent dificultats en entendre la història del diàleg tant per a la humanitat com per a la màquina. Els estudis anteriors es centren principalment en mètodes de codificació d'expressions amb característiques ben dissenyats però prestan insuficient atenció a característiques de l'estructura dels diàlegs. Tenim especialment en compte els factors estructurals i dissenyem un nou model de diàleg desorientat. Sobre la base del fet que els diàlegs estan construïts sobre la participació sucesiva i les interaccions entre parlants, modelem informació estructural dels diàlegs en dos aspectes: 1) propietat del parlant que indica de qui prové un missatge, i 2) dependencia de refer ència que mostra a qui es pot referir un missatge. El mètode proposat aconsegueix una nova actualitat en el conjunt de dades de referència IRC d'Ubuntu i contribueix a la comprensió relacionada amb el diàleg.", 'fi': 'Monipuolisen vuoropuhelun kontekstit aiheuttavat haasteita dialogin lukemisen ymmärtämiselle, jossa useat dialogin ketjut virtaavat samanaikaisesti yhteisessä dialogitiedossa, mikä vaikeuttaa sekä ihmisen että koneen vuoropuheluhistorian ymmärtämistä. Aiemmissa tutkimuksissa keskitytään pääasiassa huolellisesti suunniteltuihin ilmaisukoodausmenetelmiin, mutta dialogien rakenteen ominaispiirteisiin kiinnitetään riittämätöntä huomiota. Otamme erityisesti huomioon rakenteelliset tekijät ja suunnittelemme uudenlaisen mallin dialogin purkamiseen. Koska dialogit rakentuvat peräkkäiselle osallistumiselle ja puhujien väliselle vuorovaikutukselle, mallinnamme dialogien rakenteellista informaatiota kahdella tavalla: 1) puhujan ominaisuus, joka ilmaisee, keneltä viesti on peräisin, ja 2) viittausriippuvuus, joka osoittaa, keneen viesti voi viitata. Ehdotetulla menetelmällä saavutetaan Ubuntu IRC -vertailuaineiston uusinta tasoa ja edistetään vuoropuheluun liittyvää ymmärrystä.', 'et': 'Seotud mitmepoolse dialoogi kontekstid toovad kaasa väljakutseid dialoogi lugemise mõistmisele, kus ühises dialoogiregistris voolavad samaaegselt mitmed dialoogi lõimed, suurendades raskusi dialoogi ajaloo mõistmisel nii inimese kui masina jaoks. Varasemad uuringud keskenduvad peamiselt hoolikalt kavandatud funktsioonidega häältekodeerimismeetoditele, kuid pööravad ebapiisavat tähelepanu dialoogi struktuuri iseloomulikele omadustele. Eriti arvestame struktuurifaktoritega ja kujundame dialoogi lahutamiseks uudse mudeli. Tuginedes asjaolule, et dialoogid on ehitatud järjestikusel osalemisel ja kõnelejate vahelisel suhtlemisel, modelleerime dialoogi struktuuriinfot kahes aspektis: 1) kõneleja omadus, mis näitab, kellelt sõnum on pärit, ja 2) viitesõltuvus, mis näitab, kellele sõnum võib viidata. Kavandatud meetod saavutab Ubuntu IRC võrdlusandmekogumi uue tehnika taseme ja aitab kaasa dialoogiga seotud arusaamisele.', 'bn': 'ট্যাঙ্গেলের বহুপার্টি ডায়ালগের প্রতিযোগিতায় ডায়ালগ পাঠানোর জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জের কাছে নেয়, যেখানে মানুষ ও মেশিনের জন্য ডায়ালগের ইতিহাস বুঝতে বেশ ক Previous studies mainly focus on utterance encoding methods with carefully designed features but pay inadequate attention to characteristic features of the structure of dialogues.  বিশেষ করে আমরা কাঠামো কারণগুলোকে একাউন্টে নিয়ে যাই এবং ডিজাইন করি ডায়ালগের বিরতির জন্য একটি নবন মডেল। এই বাস্তবতার ভিত্তিতে যে কথোপকথন সফল অংশগ্রহণ এবং স্পিকেটদের মধ্যে যোগাযোগের ব্যাপারে নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে, আমরা দুই বিষয়ে আলোচনার কাঠামোর তথ্য মডেল করে দেই: ১) স্পেকার ব প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ইউবুন্টু আইআরসি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটে নতুন রাষ্ট্রের-শিল্প অর্জন করে এবং ডায়ালগের সাথে সম্পর্কিত সম্পূর্', 'sk': 'Zapleteni konteksti večstrankarskega dialoga vodijo do izzivov za razumevanje branja dialoga, kjer več dialogskih niti hkrati teče znotraj skupnega dialogskega zapisa, kar povečuje težave pri razumevanju zgodovine dialoga za človeka in stroja.', 'he': 'תקשורת דיאלוג רב-מפלגתית מוצגת מובילה לאתגרים לקריאה של דיאלוג, שבו חוטי דיאלוג רבים זורמים באותו זמן בתוך רישום דיאלוג משותף', 'jv': 'Tangled multi-parti dialog', 'ha': 'QXml', 'bo': 'Tangled multi-party dialog contexts lead to challenges for dialog reading comprehension, where multiple dialog threads flow simultaneously in a common dialog record, increasing difficulties in understanding the dialog history for both human and machine.'}
{'en': 'Divide and Denoise: Learning from Noisy Labels in Fine-Grained Entity Typing with Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'ar': 'جيل الحوار متعدد الأحزاب المتعاطف: مهمة جديدة لأنظمة الحوار', 'fr': 'Génération de dialogues empathiques multipartites\xa0: une nouvelle tâche pour les systèmes de dialogue', 'es': 'Generación de diálogo empático multipartidista: una nueva tarea para los sistemas de diálogo', 'pt': 'Geração de diálogo empático multipartidário: uma nova tarefa para sistemas de diálogo', 'ja': '多党共感ダイアログ生成：ダイアログシステムの新しいタスク', 'zh': '多方移情对话,对话系统新', 'hi': 'बहु-पक्षीय सहानुभूति संवाद पीढ़ी: संवाद प्रणालियों के लिए एक नया कार्य', 'ru': 'Создание многопартийного эмпатического диалога: новая задача для диалоговых систем', 'ga': 'Giniúint Idirphlé Ionbhách Ilpháirtí: Tasc Nua do Chórais Dialóige', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სისტემებისთვის ახალი დავალება', 'hu': 'Többpártos empatikus párbeszéd generálása: új feladat a párbeszédrendszerek számára', 'el': 'Δημιουργία πολυκομματικής ενσυναίσθησης διαλόγου: Ένα νέο έργο για τα συστήματα διαλόγου', 'it': 'Generazione di dialoghi empatici multipartitici: un nuovo compito per i sistemi di dialogo', 'kk': 'Көп бөлікті импатикалық диалогты құру: Диалог жүйелерінің жаңа тапсырмасы', 'lt': 'Daugiapartinio empatinio dialogo generacija: nauja dialogo sistemų užduotis', 'mk': 'Генерација на мултипартиски емпатичен дијалог: Нова задача за дијалошки системи', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Dialog Empatik Berlipat-Parti: Tugas Baru untuk Sistem Dialog', 'ml': 'Multi- Party Empathtic Dialog Generation: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'mt': "Ġenerazzjoni ta' Djalogu Empatiku Multipartitiku: Kompitu Ġdid għal Sistemi ta' Djalogu", 'mn': 'Олон-партийн Empathetic Dialogue Generation: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'no': 'Generering av dialogvindauge for fleire partir: Ny oppgåve for dialogsystemer', 'ro': 'Generarea dialogului empatic multipartid: o nouă sarcină pentru sistemele de dialog', 'sr': 'Generacija raznih stranaka Empatičnog dijaloga: Novi zadatak za dijalogske sisteme', 'pl': 'Generowanie empatycznego dialogu wielopartyjnego: nowe zadanie dla systemów dialogowych', 'si': 'ගොඩක් පාර්ටි සාක්ෂික සංවාදය නිර්මාණය: සංවාදය පද්ධතියට අළුත් වැඩක්', 'so': 'Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'ta': 'Multi- Party வெற்று உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்கம்: A new task for Dialog Systems', 'sv': 'Generation av empatiska dialoger med flera parter: En ny uppgift för dialogsystem', 'ur': 'Multi-Party Empathetic Dialog Generation: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Thế hệ trao đổi nhân tạo của nhiều Đảng: Một Nhiệm vụ mới cho hệ thống hộp thoại', 'bg': 'Създаване на многопартиен емпатичен диалог: нова задача за диалоговите системи', 'nl': 'Multipartijenempathische dialooggeneratie: een nieuwe taak voor dialoogsystemen', 'hr': 'Generacija raznih stranaka Empatičnog dijaloga: Novi zadatak za dijalogske sustave', 'da': 'Flerpartisk empatisk dialog Generation: En ny opgave for dialogsystemer', 'de': 'Mehrparteiige empathische Dialoggenerierung: Eine neue Aufgabe für Dialogsysteme', 'ko': '다당동리심 대화 생성: 대화 시스템의 새로운 임무', 'id': 'Generasi Dialog Empatis Multi-Party: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'fa': 'تولید محاورۀ محاورۀ مشترک چندین حزب: یک کار جدید برای سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ محاورۀ', 'sw': 'Tamko mpya kwa Mfumo wa Dialog', 'af': "Multi- Party Empathetic Dialog Generasie: ' n Nuwe Opdrag vir Dialoog SistemsComment", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Çoklu-Parti Wagtlaýyn Dialog Jemi: Bir Täze Görev Dialog Systemleri', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i dialogut empatik shumepartik: Një detyrë e re për sistemet e dialogut', 'hy': 'A New Mission for Windows', 'bs': 'Generacija raznih stranaka Empatičnog dijaloga: Novi zadatak za sisteme dijaloga', 'bn': 'Multi- Party Empathtic Dialog জেনারেশন: ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের জন্য একটি নতুন কাজ', 'az': 'Multi-Party Empathetic Dialog Generation: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'ca': 'Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'cs': 'Generování empatického dialogu pro více stran: nový úkol dialogových systémů', 'et': 'Mitmepoolse empaatilise dialoogi loomine: dialoogisüsteemide uus ülesanne', 'fi': 'Monipuolueinen empaattinen vuoropuhelu: uusi tehtĂ¤vĂ¤ vuoropuhelujĂ¤rjestelmille', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation: A New Task for Dialog Systems', 'he': 'יצירת דיאלוג אמפטי מרובי המפלגות: משימה חדשה למערכות דיאלוג', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje večstrankarskega empatičnega dialoga: nova naloga za sisteme dialoga', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་བོའི་གནད་དོན་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད། ཌའི་ལོག་མ་ལག་གི་ལས་གནད་སྡུད་གསར་པ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Fine-grained Entity Typing (FET) has made great progress based on distant supervision but still suffers from label noise. Existing FET noise learning methods rely on prediction distributions in an instance-independent manner, which causes the problem of confirmation bias. In this work, we propose a clustering-based loss correction framework named Feature Cluster Loss Correction (FCLC), to address these two problems. FCLC first train a coarse backbone model as a feature extractor and noise estimator. Loss correction is then applied to each feature cluster, learning directly from the noisy labels. Experimental results on three public datasets show that FCLC achieves the best performance over existing competitive systems. Auxiliary experiments further demonstrate that FCLC is stable to hyperparameters and it does help mitigate confirmation bias. We also find that in the extreme case of no clean data, the FCLC framework still achieves competitive performance.', 'ar': 'يجمع الحوار الوجداني فهم المشاعر وإسقاط المشاعر وتوليد الاستجابة المناسبة. يركز العمل الحالي لجيل الحوار التعاطفي على سيناريو المحادثة بين الحزبين. ومع ذلك ، فإن الحوارات متعددة الأحزاب منتشرة في الواقع. علاوة على ذلك ، عادة ما يتم الخلط بين العاطفة والحساسية ؛ هناك حاجة إلى تحليل التعاطف الدقيق لفهم المشاعر الإنسانية الهشة والدقيقة. نعالج هذه القضايا من خلال اقتراح مهمة جديدة تسمى توليد حوار متعدد الأحزاب في هذه الدراسة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تم تقديم نموذج ديناميكي ثابت لإنشاء حوار متعدد الأطراف ، SDMPED ، كخط أساس من خلال استكشاف الحساسية الثابتة والعاطفة الديناميكية لتعلم الحوار التعاطفي متعدد الأطراف ، والجوانب التي تساعد SDMPED على تحقيق حالة- الأداء الفني.', 'es': 'El diálogo empático reúne la comprensión de las emociones, la proyección de los sentimientos y la generación de respuestas adecuadas. El trabajo existente para la generación de diálogos empáticos se concentra en el escenario de la conversación entre dos partes. Sin embargo, los diálogos multipartidistas son generalizados en la realidad. Además, la emoción y la sensibilidad suelen confundirse; se necesita un análisis de empatía refinado para comprender los sentimientos humanos frágiles y matizados. Abordamos estos temas proponiendo una tarea novedosa llamada Generación de diálogo empático multipartidista en este estudio. Además, se introduce un modelo estático-dinámico para la generación de diálogo empático multipartito, SDMPED, como base al explorar la sensibilidad estática y la emoción dinámica para el aprendizaje del diálogo empático multipartidista, los aspectos que ayudan a SDMPED a lograr el rendimiento más avanzado.', 'fr': "Le dialogue empathique rassemble la compréhension des émotions, la projection des sentiments et la génération de réponses appropriées. Les travaux existants pour la génération d'un dialogue empathique se concentrent sur le scénario de conversation à deux. Les dialogues multipartites sont cependant omniprésents dans la réalité. De plus, l'émotion et la sensibilité sont généralement confondues\xa0; une analyse affinée de l'empathie est nécessaire pour comprendre les sentiments humains fragiles et nuancés. Nous abordons ces questions en proposant une nouvelle tâche appelée Génération d'un dialogue empathique multipartite dans cette étude. De plus, un modèle statique-dynamique pour la génération de dialogue empathique multipartite, SDMPED, est introduit comme base en explorant la sensibilité statique et l'émotion dynamique pour l'apprentissage du dialogue empathique multipartite, les aspects qui aident SDMPED à atteindre les performances de pointe.", 'pt': 'O diálogo empático reúne a compreensão da emoção, a projeção do sentimento e a geração de respostas apropriadas. O trabalho existente para a geração de diálogo empático concentra-se no cenário de conversação de duas partes. Diálogos multipartidários, no entanto, são difundidos na realidade. Além disso, emoção e sensibilidade são tipicamente confundidas; uma análise refinada da empatia é necessária para compreender os sentimentos humanos frágeis e matizados. Abordamos essas questões propondo uma nova tarefa chamada Geração de Diálogo Empático Multipartidário neste estudo. Além disso, um modelo Estático-Dinâmico para Geração de Diálogo Empático Multipartidário, SDMPED, é introduzido como uma linha de base explorando a sensibilidade estática e a emoção dinâmica para o aprendizado do diálogo empático multipartidário, os aspectos que ajudam o SDMPED a alcançar o estado de performance de arte.', 'ja': '共感的な対話は、感情の理解、投影の感覚、適切な応答生成を組み立てます。 共感的な対話の生成のための既存の作業は、2つのパーティーの会話シナリオに集中しています。 しかし、現実には複数政党による対話が浸透している。 さらに、感情と感性は典型的には混乱しています。脆弱で微妙な人間の感情を理解するためには、洗練された共感分析が必要です。 この研究では、マルチパーティエンパテティックダイアログジェネレーションと呼ばれる新しいタスクを提案することで、これらの問題に取り組んでいます。 さらに、マルチパーティエンパシーダイアログ生成のための静的-動的モデル、SDMPEDは、マルチパーティエンパシーダイアログ学習のための静的感受性と動的感情、SDMPEDが最先端のパフォーマンスを達成するのに役立つ側面を探求することによって、ベースラインとして導入されます。', 'zh': '移情言集情解,觉投射之应生。 移情言生事集两方对语中。 然多党言无所不在。 此外情感性混淆。 须一个精细同心分析,解脆微情。 多方移情对话生成。 又寻方移情学之静敏感性动情,引入多方移情对话生成的动静模样SDMPED为基线,此有助于SDMPED先进之性。', 'hi': 'सहानुभूतिपूर्ण संवाद भावनाओं की समझ, प्रक्षेपण महसूस करने और उचित प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी को इकट्ठा करता है। सहानुभूतिपूर्ण संवाद पीढ़ी के लिए मौजूदा काम दो-पक्षीय वार्तालाप परिदृश्य पर केंद्रित है। बहु-पार्टी संवाद, हालांकि, वास्तविकता में व्यापक हैं। इसके अलावा, भावना और संवेदनशीलता आमतौर पर भ्रमित होती है; नाजुक और सूक्ष्म मानवीय भावनाओं को समझने के लिए एक परिष्कृत सहानुभूति विश्लेषण की आवश्यकता होती है। हम इस अध्ययन में मल्टी-पार्टी सहानुभूति संवाद पीढ़ी नामक एक उपन्यास कार्य का प्रस्ताव करके इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करते हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, मल्टी-पार्टी सहानुभूति संवाद पीढ़ी, SDMPED के लिए एक स्थैतिक-गतिशील मॉडल, बहु-पार्टी सहानुभूति संवाद सीखने के लिए स्थिर संवेदनशीलता और गतिशील भावना की खोज करके एक आधार रेखा के रूप में पेश किया गया है, ऐसे पहलू जो SDMPED को अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने में मदद करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Эмпатический диалог объединяет понимание эмоций, эмоциональную проекцию и соответствующую реакцию. Существующая работа по генерации эмпатического диалога сосредоточена на сценарии двухсторонней беседы. Вместе с тем в действительности широко распространены многопартийные диалоги. Кроме того, эмоции и чувствительность обычно путаются; для понимания хрупких и нюансированных человеческих чувств необходим более точный анализ эмпатии. Мы рассматриваем эти вопросы, предлагая в этом исследовании новую задачу под названием «Построение многопартийного эмпатического диалога». Кроме того, статико-динамическая модель для генерации многопартийного эмпатического диалога, SDMPED, вводится в качестве исходной линии путем изучения статической чувствительности и динамических эмоций для обучения многопартийному эмпатическому диалогу, аспектов, которые помогают SDMPED достичь современной производительности.', 'ga': 'Déanann idirphlé ionbhách tuiscint ar mhothúchán, teilgean mothúcháin, agus giniúint freagra cuí. Díríonn an obair atá ar siúl cheana féin le haghaidh comhphlé comhbhách ar chás an chomhrá dhá pháirtí. Tá idirphlé ilpháirtí, áfach, forleatach i ndáiríre. Ina theannta sin, is gnách go mbíonn mearbhall ar mhothúchán agus ar chiall; tá gá le hanailís scagtha comhbhá chun mothúcháin leochaileacha agus nuances an duine a thuiscint. Tugaimid aghaidh ar na saincheisteanna seo trí thasc nua ar a dtugtar Giniúint Idirphlé Ionbhách Ilpháirtí a mholadh sa staidéar seo. Ina theannta sin, tugtar isteach samhail Statach-Dinimiceach do Ghiniúint Idirphlé Ionbhách Ilpháirtí, SDMPED, mar bhunlíne trí iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar an íogaireacht statach agus ar an mothúchán dinimiciúil don fhoghlaim ilpháirtí ionbhách idirphlé, na gnéithe a chuidíonn le SDMPED an staid a bhaint amach. feidhmíocht den scoth.', 'hu': 'Az empatikus párbeszéd összeállítja az érzelmek megértését, az érzések kivetítését és a megfelelő válasz generálását. Az empatikus párbeszéd generálásának meglévő munkája a kétpártos beszélgetési forgatókönyvre összpontosít. A többpártos párbeszédek azonban a valóságban átfogóak. Továbbá az érzelmek és az érzékenység jellemzően összezavarodnak; A törékeny és árnyalt emberi érzések megértéséhez finomított empátia elemzésre van szükség. Ezeket a kérdéseket úgy foglalkozunk, hogy a tanulmányban egy új feladatot javasolunk a Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation címmel. Ezenkívül a többpártos empatikus párbeszéd generálásának statikus-dinamikus modelljét, az SDMPED-et vezetik be alapként a többpártos empatikus párbeszéd tanulásának statikus érzékenységének és dinamikus érzelmeinek feltárásával, amelyek segítenek az SDMPED-nek a legkorszerűbb teljesítmény elérésében.', 'el': 'Ο ενσυναίσθητος διάλογος συγκεντρώνει την κατανόηση συναισθημάτων, την προβολή συναισθημάτων και την κατάλληλη παραγωγή απόκρισης. Η υπάρχουσα εργασία για τη δημιουργία ενσυναίσθητου διαλόγου επικεντρώνεται στο σενάριο συζήτησης δύο μερών. Ωστόσο, οι πολυκομματικοί διάλογοι είναι διάχυτοι στην πραγματικότητα. Επιπλέον, το συναίσθημα και η ευαισθησία συνήθως μπερδεύονται. Μια εκλεπτυσμένη ανάλυση ενσυναίσθησης είναι απαραίτητη για την κατανόηση των εύθραυστων και διαφοροποιημένων ανθρώπινων συναισθημάτων. Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτά τα ζητήματα προτείνοντας ένα νέο έργο που ονομάζεται Δημιουργία Πολυκομματικού Συμπαθητικού Διαλόγου στην παρούσα μελέτη. Επιπλέον, ένα στατικό-δυναμικό μοντέλο για τη δημιουργία πολυκομματικού ενσυναίσθητου διαλόγου εισάγεται ως βάση εξερευνώντας τη στατική ευαισθησία και το δυναμικό συναίσθημα για την εκμάθηση πολυκομματικού ενσυναίσθητου διαλόγου, τις πτυχές που βοηθούν το να επιτύχει την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση.', 'ka': 'ემპოექტიკური დიალოგი იყენებს ემოციონის გაგრძნობა, პროექცია და შესაძლებელი განახლება. ემპოტეტიკური დიალოგის განვითარებისთვის მუშაობელი სამუშაო მუშაობა კონტენსტურებულია ორი პარუხის სინარიოში. მაგრამ, მრავალ-პარტის დიალოგიები რეალურობაში უფრო დიალოგიურია. დამატებით, ემოცია და სინცემულობა ტიპიკურად დაბრუნებიან; განსაზღვრებული ემპატიის ანალიზაცია უნდა იყოს, რომ გავიგოთ კპატილური და უნდა ადამიანის ფეგურები. ჩვენ ამ პრობლემების შესახებ პრომენტის რაოდენობა, რომელიც მრავალ-პოტიური ემპოტიური დიალოგის შესახებ ამ სწავლაში. დამატებით, Multi-party Empathetic Dialog Generation (SDMPED) სტატიკური-დინამიკური მოდელი იყენება, როგორც ფესტიკური სინცემულობა და დინამიკური ემოცია მრავალ-ფესტიკური დიალოგის სწავლებისთვის, აპექტები, რომლებიც SDMPED-ს დახმარებენ სტა', 'it': "Il dialogo empatico riunisce la comprensione delle emozioni, la proiezione dei sentimenti e la generazione di risposte appropriate. Il lavoro esistente per la generazione del dialogo empatico si concentra sullo scenario di conversazione a due parti. I dialoghi multipartitici, tuttavia, sono pervasivi nella realtà. Inoltre, emozione e sensibilità sono tipicamente confusi; Una raffinata analisi empatica è necessaria per comprendere i sentimenti umani fragili e sfumati. Affrontiamo questi problemi proponendo un nuovo compito chiamato Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation in questo studio. Inoltre, un modello statico-dinamico per la generazione del dialogo empatico multipartitico, SDMPED, viene introdotto come base esplorando la sensibilità statica e l'emozione dinamica per l'apprendimento del dialogo empatico multipartitico, gli aspetti che aiutano SDMPED a raggiungere le prestazioni all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Эмоциялық түсініктерді, проекциялық сезімін және жауап беруді жасайды. Эмпатикалық диалогты құру үшін барлық жұмыс екі партиялық сәйкес сценариясына тұрады. Бірақ бірнеше партиялық диалогтар шындығында көптеген. Сонымен қатар, емоциялық және сезімділік кәдімгі әдетте айырылады; көпшілікті және көпшілікті адамдардың сезімдерін түсінуге қажет болады. Біз бұл мәселелерді осы зерттеулерде көп партиялық импатикалық диалогты құру деген романдық тапсырманы ұсынып тастаймыз. Сонымен қатар, көптеген партиялық импатикалық диалогты құру үшін Статикалық динамикалық модель SDMPED, көп партиялық импатикалық диалогты оқыту үшін статикалық сезімділік және динамикалық эмоциялық оқыту үшін негізгі сызық ретінде, SDMPED- дің көмектесетін', 'lt': 'Empatinis dialogas sukuria emocijų supratimą, jausmą, projekciją ir tinkamą atsako generaciją. Existing work for empathetic dialogue generation concentrates on the two-party conversation scenario.  Multi-party dialogues, however, are pervasive in reality.  Be to, emocijos ir jautrumas paprastai supainioti; norint suprasti pažeidžiamus ir nuancijuotus žmogaus jausmus, būtina išsami empatijos analizė. Šiuos klausimus sprendžiame siūlydami naują užduotį, vadinamą daugiašalių partijų empatinio dialogo generacija šiame tyrime. Be to, kaip pagrindą nustatomas daugiapakopio empatinio dialogo generacijos statinis dinaminis model is, SDMPED, tiriant daugiapakopio empatinio dialogo mokymosi statinį jautrumą ir dinamišką emociją – aspektus, kurie padeda SDMPED pasiekti pažangiausius rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Импатичкиот дијалог собира емоционално разбирање, чувство на проекција и соодветна генерација на одговор. Постојачката работа за генерација на емпатичен дијалог се концентрира на сценариото за двопartiчен разговор. Сепак, мултипартиските дијалози се проширени во реалноста. Покрај тоа, емоциите и чувствителноста се обично збунети; е потребна рефинирана анализа на емпатијата за разбирање на кревките и нијансираните човечки чувства. Ние ги решаваме овие прашања предлагајќи нова задача наречена Мултипартиска генерација на емпатичен дијалог во оваа студија. Покрај тоа, Статички-динамичен модел за генерација на мултипартиски емпатичен дијалог, СДМПЕД, е воведен како основа со истражување на статичката чувствителност и динамичните емоции за учењето на мултипартискиот емпатичен дијалог, аспектите кои им помагаат на СДМПЕД да ја постигне најсовремената претстава.', 'mt': "Id-djalogu empatiku jiġbor flimkien il-fehim emozzjonali, il-projezzjoni tat-tħossok, u l-ġenerazzjoni xierqa tar-rispons. Il-ħidma eżistenti għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ djalogu empatiku tikkonċentra fuq ix-xenarju ta’ konverżjoni bejn żewġ partijiet. Madankollu, id-djalogi multipartiti huma mifruxa fir-realtà. Barra minn hekk, l-emozzjoni u s-sensittività huma tipikament konfużi; hija meħtieġa analiżi raffinata tal-empatija biex tifhem sensazzjonijiet fraġli u nuanċjati tal-bniedem. Nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet billi nipproponu kompitu ġdid imsejjaħ Ġenerazzjoni ta' Djalogu Empatiku Multipartitiku f'dan l-istudju. Barra minn hekk, mudell statiku-dinamiku għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Djalogu Empatiku Multipartitiku, SDMPED, huwa introdott bħala linja bażi billi tiġi esplorata s-sensittività statika u l-emozzjoni dinamika għat-tagħlim ta’ djalogu empatiku multipartitiku, l-aspetti li jgħinu lill-SDMPED jikseb il-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata.", 'ms': 'Dialog empatik mengumpulkan pemahaman emosi, perasaan projeksi, dan generasi balas yang sesuai. Kerja yang wujud untuk generasi dialog empati berkonsentrasi pada skenario perbualan dua pihak. Dialog berbilang-parti, bagaimanapun, adalah luas dalam kenyataan. Furthermore, emotion and sensibility are typically confused;  analisis empati yang sempurna diperlukan untuk memahami perasaan manusia yang rapuh dan berwarna-warna. Kami mengatasi isu-isu ini dengan melamar tugas baru yang dipanggil Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation dalam kajian ini. Lagipun, model statik-dinamik untuk Generasi Dialog Empatik Berlipat-Parti, SDMPED, diperkenalkan sebagai dasar dengan mengeksplorasi sensitiviti statik dan emosi dinamik untuk pembelajaran dialog empatik berbilang-parti, aspek yang membantu SDMPED mencapai prestasi-state-of-the-art.', 'ml': 'ശൂന്യമായ ഡയലോഗ് വികാരം മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു, പ്രൊജക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രൊജക്ഷന്\u200d, പ്രതികരണ തലമുറയും ഒരുമിച്ചു ശാസ്ത്രീയ സംസാരത്തിന്റെ തലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള ജോലി രണ്ട് പാര്\u200dട്ടി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സാഹചര്യത്തിന്റ ഒരുപാട് പാര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ഡയലോഗുകള്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥത്തില്\u200d വലുതാണ്. അതിനുശേഷം, വികാരവും ബോധവും സാധാരണയായി കുഴപ്പമുണ്ട്; തീര്\u200dച്ചയായും മനുഷ്യരുടെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു ശാന്തിയുടെ അന്വേഷണം ആവശ്യമാണ്. ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d പല-പാര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ശാസ്ത്രജീവിതത്തിന്റെ പേരില്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ജോലിയെ പ്രാദോഷിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന മറ്റു പാര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ ശാസ്ത്രജീവിതത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു സ്റ്റാറിക്-ഡിനാമിക്ക് മാതൃകയാണ്, SDMPED, ഒരു ബെസ്റ്റാല്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ആയി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പല-പാര്\u200dട്ടിക്ക് ശാസ്ത്രശീലതയുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് പഠിക്ക', 'no': 'Empatisk dialogvindauge samler følelsesforståelse, følelsesøk og tilpassande svar. Det eksisterande arbeidet for empatisk dialoggenerasjon konsentrerer på samtalescenarioen for to partier. Dialogvindauge for fleire partier er imidlertid vasive i virkelighet. I tillegg er følelser og følelsesomhet vanlegvis forvirra; Det er nødvendig ein refined empatisk analyse for å forstå fragile og nuanced menneskelige følelser. Vi handler desse problemene ved å foreslå eit nytt oppgåve kalla «Multi-Party Empathetic Dialog Generation» i denne studien. I tillegg vert det introdusert ein statistisk dynamisk modell for generering av dialogvindauge med fleire partir, SDMPED, som ein grunnlinje ved å undersøke statisk sensibilitet og dynamisk emosjon for læring av dialogvindauget med fleire partir, aspektane som hjelper SDMPED til å oppnå kunstendigheten.', 'pl': 'Empatyczny dialog łączy zrozumienie emocji, projekcję uczuć i odpowiednie generowanie reakcji. Dotychczasowe prace nad generowaniem empatycznego dialogu koncentrują się na scenariuszu rozmowy dwustronnej. W rzeczywistości jednak dialog wielopartyjny jest powszechny. Ponadto emocje i wrażliwość są zazwyczaj mylone; Wyrafinowana analiza empatii jest potrzebna do zrozumienia delikatnych i niuansowych ludzkich uczuć. Zajmujemy się tymi kwestiami proponując w niniejszym opracowaniu nowe zadanie o nazwie Wielopartyjny Empatyczny Dialog Generowanie. Dodatkowo, model statyczno-dynamiczny dla generowania dialogów empatycznych wielu stron, SDMPED, został wprowadzony jako baza podstawowa poprzez badanie statycznej wrażliwości i dynamicznych emocji dla uczenia się dialogu empatycznego wielu stron, aspektów, które pomagają SDMPED osiągnąć najnowocześniejszą wydajność.', 'mn': 'Харин эзэмшигтэй диалог сэтгэл хөдлөлийн ойлголт, мэдрэмж, зөв хариу үйлдэл үүсгэдэг. Эзэмшигтэй диалог үеийн ажил хоёр партийн ярианы хувилбарт төвлөрүүлдэг. Гэхдээ олон төрлийн диалогууд бодит байдлын тухай ихэвчлэн нэмэгддэг. Дараа нь сэтгэл хөдлөл, мэдрэмж ихэвчлэн төвөгтэй. хүн төрөлхтний мэдрэмжүүдийг ойлгохын тулд сайхан сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ хэрэгтэй. Бид эдгээр асуудлуудыг энэ судалгаанд олон партийн эзэмшигтэй диалогын төлөөлөл гэж нэрлэсэн шинэ даалгаварыг суралцаж байна. Мөн олон партийн хамтрагч диалогын төлөөлөлт, SDMPED-ын Статик-Динамик загвар нь олон партийн хамтрагч диалогын суралцах болон улс төрлийн мэдрэмжтэй сэтгэл хөдлөлийг судалж, SDMPED-д урлагийн үйл ажиллагаанд тусалдаг асуудлуудыг суралцаж байдаг.', 'ro': 'Dialogul empatic adună înțelegerea emoțiilor, proiecția sentimentelor și generarea de răspunsuri adecvate. Lucrările existente pentru generarea dialogului empatic se concentrează pe scenariul conversației cu două părți. Cu toate acestea, dialogurile multipartite sunt cuprinzătoare în realitate. În plus, emoția și sensibilitatea sunt de obicei confuze; Este necesară o analiză rafinată a empatiei pentru a înțelege sentimentele umane fragile și nuanțate. Vom aborda aceste probleme propunând în acest studiu o sarcină nouă numită Generarea Dialogului Empatetic Multipartid. În plus, un model static-dinamic pentru generarea dialogului empatic multi-partid, SDMPED, este introdus ca bază prin explorarea sensibilității statice și emoțiilor dinamice pentru învățarea dialogului empatic multi-partid, aspectele care ajută SDMPED să obțină performanța de ultimă oră.', 'so': 'Dialog kali ah wuxuu soo ururiyaa waxgarashada hissiga, xisaabashada, iyo farshaha jawaabta saxda ah. Shaqo ku jira oo ku qoran sameynta labada kooxood waxay ku qoran yihiin halka hadalka labada party. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa dhab ah ku qoran dialogueoyinka kooxo badan. Intaas waxaa dheer, hissiga iyo fahanku way qasnaan yihiin sida caadiga ah; baaritaanka jimicsiga waxaa loo baahan yahay in loo ogaado fikrada xunxun iyo caqliga ah. Waxyaabahaas waxan ayaannu ku sheekeynaynaa arimahan ku qoran qoraalka jaamacadda ee la yidhaahdo Multi-Party Empathetic Generation arimahan waxbarashadan. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa saxda-Dynamic model for multi-party Empathetic Dialog Generation, SDMPED waxaa looga soo bandhigay sida shabakad oo looga baaraandegay saxda sensibility iyo dynamic emotions for barashada dialog-empathetic badan, aspects that helps SDMPED achieve the state-of-art performance.', 'sv': 'Empatetic dialog samlar känsloförståelse, känsloprojektion och lämplig responsgenerering. Befintligt arbete för skapandet av empatisk dialog fokuserar på tvåpartssamtalsscenariot. Flerpartisdialoger är emellertid genomgripande i verkligheten. Dessutom är känslor och känslighet vanligtvis förvirrade. En förfinad empatianalys behövs för att förstå sköra och nyanserade mänskliga känslor. Vi tar itu med dessa frågor genom att föreslå en ny uppgift kallad Multi-Party Empatetic Dialogue Generation i denna studie. Dessutom introduceras en statisk-dynamisk modell för generation av flerpartsempatiska dialoger, SDMPED, som utgångspunkt genom att utforska den statiska känsligheten och dynamiska känslan för lärande av flerpartsempatiska dialoger, de aspekter som hjälper SDMPED att uppnå toppmodern prestanda.', 'sr': 'Empatički dijalog okuplja emocionalno razumijevanje, projekciju i odgovarajuću generaciju odgovora. Postojeći rad za generaciju empatičkog dijaloga koncentriše se na scenario razgovora dve strane. Međutim, mnogobrojni dijalogi su prošireni u stvarnosti. Osim toga, emocije i osjetljivost su obično zbunjeni; Potrebna je određena analiza empatije za razumevanje krhkih i nuanciranih ljudskih osjećaja. Rešavamo te probleme predloženjem novog zadatka koji se zove Generacija Empatičnog dijaloga multipartija u ovoj studiji. Osim toga, statistički dinamički model za generaciju Empatičnog dijaloga multistranaka SDMPED se uvede kao osnovni linija istraživanjem statične senzibiliteta i dinamične emocije za učenje empatičkog dijaloga multistranaka, aspektima koji pomažu SDMPED postići stanje umjetnosti.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා හැඟීමක් තේරුම, හැඟීමක් දැනෙනවා, සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය පාර්ටි දෙකක් කතා කරන්න සිනාරියෝ වලට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සංවාදය සඳහා තියෙන්නේ වැඩක්. ඒත් ගොඩක් පාර්ටි සංවාදයක් ඇත්තටම විශාලයි. එතකොට, හැඟීම සහ හැඟීමත් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ වෙනවා; විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න ඕනේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් නැති මිනිස්සුන්ගේ දැන අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ විශ්ණාවේ වඩා පාර්ටි සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාදය නිර්මාණය කර ඉතින්, Multi-Parts Empathetic Conversations General, SDMPED, ස්ථිතිය-ධාර්මික සංවාදයක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්ථිතිය-ධාර්මික සංවාදයක් විදිහට, සංවාදයක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ස්ථිති', 'ta': 'வெற்று உரையாடல் உணர்வு புரிந்து, உணர்வு திட்டத்தை மற்றும் தேவையான பதில் தலைமுறையை ஒன்று சேர் வாழ்க்கையான உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்கும் தற்போதைய வேலை இரண்டு அமர்ந்த பேச்சு காட்சியில் உள்ளது. பல- கட்சி உரையாடல் உண்மையில் பெருக்கலானது. மேலும், உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு வழக்கமாக குழப்பமாக இருக்கிறது; ஒரு திருத்தமான உணர்வுகளை புரிந்து கொள்வதற்காக ஒரு தேவைப்படுகிறது. பல- Party வெற்றியடைந்த உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்தை இந்த விஷயங்களை நாம் விளக்குகிறோம். மேலும், Multi- Party வெற்றிடும் உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்திற்கான ஒரு நிலையான- Dynamic மாதிரி SDMPED, முன்னணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பல- party வாழ்க்கை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் நிலையில் இருக்கும் உணர்வு மற்றும் இயங்கு', 'ur': 'مغفرت کی گفتگو احساس سمجھ، احساس کا احساس، اور مناسب جواب کی نسل جمع کرتا ہے. دو پارتی صحبت سناریو پر مشارکت ہے لیکن بہت سی پارٹی ڈالیوں حقیقت میں بہت وسیع ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، احساسات اور احساسات معمولاً پیچیدہ ہیں، ایک پاکیزہ شرمندگی تحقیق کی ضرورت ہے کہ انسان کے احساسات شکستہ اور ناپاک سمجھنے کے لئے۔ ہم ان مسائلیوں کو اس تحقیق میں ایک نو کام پیشنهاد کریں گے جس کا نام Multi-Party Empathetic Dialog Generation ہے. اور اضافہ، Multi-Party Empathetic Dialog Generation کے لئے ایک ایسٹیسی-دینامیک موڈل، SDMPED، ایسٹیسی-دینامیک موڈل بنیادی لین کے طور پر پیش کیا جاتا ہے، جسے multi-party empathetic dialog learning کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے استٹیسی سنسی بلیت اور سینکی احساسات کا تحقیق کرتا ہے، اس کے اندازے جو SDMPED کی مدد کرتی ہیں ان کی حالت-هنر کی عم', 'vi': 'Đối thoại Empathic lắp đặt sự thấu cảm xúc, cảm xúc phù hợp, và tạo phản ứng thích hợp. Việc tồn tại cho thế hệ của sự đồng cảm hứng tập trung vào kịch bản đối thoại hai Đảng. Liên lạc nhiều Đảng luôn diễn ra trong thực tế. Tình cảm và nhạy cảm thường bị lẫn lộn; Cần một nghiên cứu tinh tế tinh tế tinh tế tinh tế tinh vi để hiểu cảm xúc của con người. Chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề này bằng cách đề xuất một nhiệm vụ mới gọi là Thế hệ trao đổi nhân tạo. Thêm vào đó, một mô hình tĩnh động cho Thế hệ đối thoại Empathic, SDMPD, được tạo ra như một cơ sở cơ bản bằng cách khám phá sự nhạy cảm tĩnh động và cảm xúc động động cho học thoại cảm thông của nhiều Đảng, các khía cạnh giúp SDMPD đạt được hiệu quả tuyệt vời.', 'uz': "Boʻsh muloqat oynasi hissiyotni tushunish, hisoblash va mos keladigan javob yaratishni birlashadi. Existing work for empathetic dialogue generation concentrates on the two-party conversation scenario.  Ko'pchilik muloqat oynalari haqida katta. Ko'rsatganda, hissiyotlar va hissiyotlik oddiy qanday bog'liq; qo'shilgan qo'shiqni o'rganish uchun o'zgartirish kerak. Biz bu muammolarni shu tadqida ko'pchilik muloqat muloqat muloqat oynasi yaratish uchun novel vazifasini talab qilamiz. Ko'pchilik muloqat oynasi yaratish uchun Statik- Dynamic modeli SDMPED, muloqat oynasi o'rganish uchun statik sensibiligi va dynamik hissiyotini aniqlash mumkin, SDMPED shaxsiyatni bajarishga yordam beradi.", 'bg': 'Емпатичният диалог обединява разбиране на емоциите, проекция на чувствата и подходящо генериране на отговор. Съществуващата работа за генериране на емпатичен диалог се концентрира върху сценария на двупартиен разговор. Многопартийните диалози обаче са широко разпространени в действителност. Освен това емоцията и чувствителността обикновено са объркани; Необходим е изтънчен анализ на съпричастността за разбиране на крехките и нюансирани човешки чувства. Ние разглеждаме тези въпроси, като предлагаме нова задача, наречена Многопартиен емпатичен диалог генериране в това проучване. Освен това, като основна база е въведен статично-динамичен модел за генериране на многопартиен емпатичен диалог чрез изследване на статичната чувствителност и динамичната емоция за ученето на многопартийния емпатичен диалог, аспектите, които помагат на SDMPED да постигне най-съвременното изпълнение.', 'da': 'Empatetisk dialog samler følelsesforforståelse, følelsesprojektion og passende responsgenerering. Eksisterende arbejde for empatisk dialog generation koncentrerer sig om to-partssamtale scenariet. Flerpartisdialoger er imidlertid gennemgribende i virkeligheden. Desuden er følelser og følsomhed typisk forvirret; En raffineret empatianalyse er nødvendig for at forstå skrøbelige og nuancerede menneskelige følelser. Vi behandler disse spørgsmål ved at foreslå en ny opgave kaldet Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation i denne undersøgelse. Derudover introduceres en statisk-dynamisk model for Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation, SDMPED, som baseline ved at udforske den statiske følsomhed og dynamiske følelser for multi-party empatisk dialog læring, de aspekter, der hjælper SDMPED med at opnå state-of-the-art performance.', 'de': 'Empathischer Dialog vereint Emotionsverständnis, Gefühlsprojektion und angemessene Reaktionsgenerierung. Bestehende Arbeiten zur empathischen Dialoggenerierung konzentrieren sich auf das Zweiparteiengespräch-Szenario. Mehrparteiendialoge sind jedoch in der Realität allgegenwärtig. Darüber hinaus sind Emotion und Sensibilität typischerweise verwirrt; Eine verfeinerte Empathieanalyse ist notwendig, um fragile und nuancierte menschliche Gefühle zu verstehen. Wir befassen uns mit diesen Fragen, indem wir in dieser Studie eine neue Aufgabe namens Multi-Party Empathic Dialogue Generation vorschlagen. Zusätzlich wird ein statisch-dynamisches Modell für Multi-Party Empathic Dialogue Generation, SDMPED, als Basis eingeführt, indem die statische Sensibilität und dynamische Emotion für das Multi-Party Empathic Dialoglearning untersucht werden, die Aspekte, die SDMPED helfen, die State-of-the-Art Performance zu erreichen.', 'hr': 'Empatički dijalog skuplja razumijevanje emocija, projekciju osjećaja i odgovarajuću generaciju odgovora. Postojeći rad za generaciju empatičkog dijaloga usredotoči se na scenario razgovora s dvije strane. Međutim, mnogobrojni dijalogi su prošireni u stvarnosti. Osim toga, emocije i osjetljivost su obično zbunjeni; potrebna je određena analiza empatije za razumijevanje krhkih i nuanciranih ljudskih osjećaja. Razgovaramo s tim pitanjima predloženjem novog zadatka zvanog Generacijom multipartijskog dijaloga u ovoj studiji. Osim toga, statistički dinamički model za generaciju Empatičnog dijaloga multistranaka SDMPED se uvodi kao početnu liniju istražujući statičnu osjetljivost i dinamičnu emociju za učenje empatičkog dijaloga multistranaka, aspekte koji pomažu SDMPED postići postignuće postupka umjetnosti.', 'nl': 'Empathische dialoog brengt emotie begrip, gevoelsprojectie en passende responsgeneratie samen. Bestaande werkzaamheden voor empathische dialooggeneratie concentreren zich op het tweepartijenconversatiescenario. De dialoog tussen meerdere partijen is echter alomtegenwoordig. Bovendien zijn emotie en gevoeligheid typisch verward; Een verfijnde empathieanalyse is nodig om kwetsbare en genuanceerde menselijke gevoelens te begrijpen. We pakken deze kwesties aan door in deze studie een nieuwe taak voor te stellen genaamd Multi-Party Empathic Dialogue Generation. Daarnaast wordt een Static-Dynamic model voor Multi-Party Empathic Dialogue Generation, SDMPED, geïntroduceerd als basis door het verkennen van de statische gevoeligheid en dynamische emotie voor het multi-party empathische dialoogleren, de aspecten die SDMPED helpen om de state-of-the-art prestaties te bereiken.', 'id': 'Dialog empati mengumpulkan pemahaman emosi, perasaan proyeksi, dan generasi respon yang sesuai. Pekerjaan yang ada untuk generasi dialog empati berkonsentrasi pada skenario percakapan dua pihak. Dialog multipartis, bagaimanapun, adalah luas dalam kenyataan. Selain itu, emosi dan sensibilitas biasanya bingung; a refined empathy analysis is needed for comprehending fragile and nuanced human feelings.  Kami mengatasi masalah ini dengan mengusulkan tugas baru bernama Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation dalam studi ini. Selain itu, sebuah model statik-dinamik untuk Generasi Dialog Empatis Multi-Party, SDMPED, diperkenalkan sebagai dasar dengan mengeksplorasi sensibilitas statik dan emosi dinamik untuk belajar dialog empatis multi-party, aspek yang membantu SDMPED mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art.', 'ko': '이정 대화는 감정 이해, 감정 투사와 적당한 반응을 하나로 모인다.기존의 이정 대화 생성 작업은 주로 양당의 대화 장면에 집중되어 있다.그러나 다당 대화는 현실에 없는 곳이 없다.그 밖에 감정과 감정은 통상적으로 혼동된다.취약하고 미묘한 인간의 감정을 이해하기 위해서는 정교한 이정 분석이 필요하다.이 연구에서 우리는 이런 문제들을 해결하기 위해 다당동리심 대화의 생성이라는 새로운 임무를 제시했다.또한 다방면 이정 대화 학습의 정적 민감성과 동적 감정을 탐색함으로써 다방면 이정 대화가 생성하는 정적-동적 모델인 SDMPED를 기선으로 도입하는 등 SDMPED가 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현하는 데 도움이 된다.', 'tr': 'Empatik dialogy du첵gulary흫 d체힊체n체힊ini, du첵gularyny we gowy jogaplary jemgyla첵ar. empatik dialogy흫 d철wletleri 체챌in bar i힊i iki b철l체m 챌yky힊 senary첵asyna 체ns ber첵채r. 횦철ne k철p-topar dialoglar ger챌ekli휓inde 철r채n m철h체m bir 힊ekilde 챌ykar. Mundan so흫ra du첵gym we du첵gym adat챌a 챌al힊yryl첵ar; d철w체r체len empati첵a analyzasy d철w체r체len we da힊yrly adam du첵gularyny d체힊체nmek 체챌in gerek. Biz bu temalary 힊u 철wrenmede "K철p-Parti첵al Empatik Dialog Generasy" di첵ip t채ze zady teklip eden 챌yk첵arys. Ayr캇ca, Multi-Parti Empatik Dialog Generasy 체챌in Statik-Dynamik Modeli SDMPED, multi-parti empatik dialogy 철wrenmesi 체챌in statik du첵gularyny we dynamik du첵gularyny g철zlemek 체챌in bir suz 챌yky힊 h철km체nde introduced edildi.', 'af': "Empatiese dialoog versamel emosie verstanding, voel projeksie en regverdige reaksie generasie. Bestaande werk vir empatiese dialoog generasie konsantreer op die twee party gespreks scenario. Multi party-dialoog is egter oorvloedig in werklikheid. Verder is emosie en sensibiliteit tipies verdwyn; â\x80\x99n gevormige empatiese analiseer is benodig vir die verstaan van kragtige en nuanced menslike gevoele. Ons adres hierdie probleme deur 'n nuwe taak te voorstel wat Multi-Party Empathetic Dialog Generasie in hierdie studie genoem word. In addition, the Static-Dynamic model for Multi-Party Empathetic Dialog Generation, SDMPED, is introduced as a baseline by exploring the static sensibility and dynamic emotion for the multi-party empathetic dialog learning, the aspects that help SDMPED achieve the state-of-the-art performance.", 'sq': 'Dialogu empatik mbledh kuptimin e emocioneve, ndjenjën e projeksionit dhe gjeneratën e përgjigjes së përshtatshme. Puna ekzistuese për gjeneratën e dialogut empatik përqëndrohet në skenarin e bisedës dy-palëshe. Megjithatë, dialoget shumepartike janë të përhapura në realitet. Përveç kësaj, emocionet dhe ndjeshmëria janë tipikisht të konfuzuara; është e nevojshme një analizë e rafinuar empatie për të kuptuar ndjenjat e dobëta dhe të nuancuara njerëzore. Ne i trajtojmë këto çështje duke propozuar një detyrë të re të quajtur Gjenerimi i Dialogut Empatik Multi-Partik në këtë studim. Përveç kësaj, një model statik-dinamik për Gjenerimin e Dialogut Empatik Multipartik, SDMPED, futet si një bazë duke eksploruar ndjeshmërinë statike dhe emocionet dinamike për mësimin e dialogut empatik multipartik, aspektet që ndihmojnë SDMPED të arrijë shfaqjen më të lartë.', 'fa': 'گفتگوی مشتاق درک احساسات، احساسات و نسل جواب مناسب را جمع می کند. کار موجود برای نسل گفتگوی مشهور روی صحنه صحبت دو حزب تمرکز می\u200cکند. ولی گفتگوهای زیادی از حزب\u200cها در واقعیت گسترده\u200cاند. علاوه بر این، احساسات و احساسات معمولاً پیچیده می شوند. برای فهمیدن احساسات شکسته و ناتوانی انسان نیاز دارد. ما این مسائل را با پیشنهاد کردن یک کار نویسی به نام نسل گفتگوی مشترک چند حزب در این مطالعه درگیر می کنیم. علاوه بر این، یک مدل سیاسی-دینامیک برای تولید محاوطه\u200cهای مشترک، SDMPED، به عنوان یک خط بنیادی معرفی می\u200cشود با تحقیق احساسات سیاسی و دینامیک برای یادگیری محاوطه\u200cهای مشترک بین\u200cگروه\u200cها، نقطه\u200cهایی که به SDMPED کمک می\u200cکنند به رسیدن عملکرد هنری.', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo ya Empathy yanakusanya kuelewa hisia, hisia za kutengenezwa, na kizazi kinachofaa. Kazi zinazopo kwa ajili ya mazungumzo ya kisiasa yanajikita kwenye eneo la mazungumzo ya vyama viwili. Mazungumzo ya vyama vingi, hata hivyo, ni makubwa sana. Furthermore, emotion and sensibility are typically confused;  uchambuzi wa hali ya huruma unahitajika kwa kuelewa hisia za binadamu zilizotokana na vigumu. Tunaongelea masuala haya kwa kupendekeza kazi ya riwaya inayoitwa Generation of Dialogue Multi-Party Empathy katika utafiti huu. Zaidi ya hayo, modeli ya Static-Dynamic kwa ajili ya Generation of Party Empathtic Dialogue, SDMPED, inaonyeshwa kama msingi wa msingi kwa kutambua hisia za stadi na za dynami za kujifunza mazungumzo ya kisiasa ya kisiasa, masuala yanayosaidia SDMPED kupata hali ya utendaji wa sanaa.', 'az': "Empatik dialońüu duygusal anlayńĪŇüńĪnńĪ, hissl…ôri v…ô uyńüun cavab ver…ôni birl…ôŇüdirir. ńįki parti m√ľzakir…ô senaryosuna m√∂vcuddur. Ancaq √ßoxlu parti danńĪŇümalarńĪ h…ôqiq…ôtd…ô √ßox geniŇüliydir. Daha sonra, duygularńĪ v…ô hissl…ôri genellikle karńĪŇümńĪŇüdńĪr. ńįnsanlarńĪn hissl…ôrini anlamaq √ľ√ß√ľn t…ômizl…ônmiŇü empati analizi lazńĪmdńĪr. Biz bu m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôri bu t…ôhsil i√ßind…ô √ßoxlu-Parti Empatetic Dialog Generation adlńĪ yeni iŇü t…ôklif edirik. Daha da, √ßoxlu Parti Empatic Dialog Generation √ľ√ß√ľn Static-Dynamic Model, SDMPED, √ßoxlu parti empatic dialog √∂yr…ônm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn statik hissl…ôri v…ô dinamik hissl…ôri t…ôŇükil edib, SDMPED'in sanat performansńĪnńĪ yerin…ô yetirm…ôsin…ô k√∂m…ôk ed…ôn aspektl…ôr t…ôŇükil edilir.", 'hy': 'Ամպատիկ երկխոսությունը հավաքում է զգացմունքների հասկացությունը, զգացմունքները և հարմար արձագանքների սերունդը: Գոյություն ունի կարեկցանքի խոսակցության սերունդ, որը կենտրոնանում է երկու կողմի խոսակցության սցենարիայի վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, բազմամասնությամբ հաղորդակցությունները իրականության մեջ տարածված են: Ավելին, զգացմունքները և զգացմունքները սովորաբար շփոթված են, անհրաժեշտ է բարելավված կարեկցանքի վերլուծություն, որպեսզի հասկանանք մարդկային զգացմունքները՝ փխրուն և նյուանսացված: We address these issues by proposing a novel task called Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation in this study.  Ավելին, բազմակողմների ամպատիկ դասախոսության ստեղծման կարգավոր-դինամիկ մոդելը, ՍԴՄՊԵԴ, ներկայացվում է որպես հիմք, ուսումնասիրելով բազմակողմների ամպատիկ դասախոսության կարգավորությունը և դինամիկ զգացմունքը, այն ասպեկտները, որոնք օգնում են ՍԴՄՊԵԴ-ին հասնել բարձր արդյունքների:', 'am': 'ዶሴ የውይይት አካባቢ ትውልድ በሁለቱ የፓርቲ ንግግር ማዕከላዊ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የብዙ ፓርቲ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ እውነተኛ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ እውቀት እና ስህተት በተለየ:: የስህተት አስተያየት የሰው ስብሰባዎችን ለማስተዋል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የብዙ ፓርቲ ነፃነት አዲስ ማህበረሰብ በሚባል የኖሮው ስራ አቀላቅልናል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ለብዙው ፓርቲ ነፃነት አቀማመጥ (SDMPED) ስቴቲካዊ እና ዲያኖሚክ ሞዴል ለብዙፓርቲው የኢትዮጵያ አካባቢ ትምህርት ለመማር የሚረዳው ስድኤምED የዐርድ-አርእስት ግንኙነትን ለመግኘት የሚችሉትን የድምፅ ስህተት እና የዲያሜናዊ እውቀት በመጠቀም የሚታወቀው ጥያቄ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'ফাঁকা ডায়ালগ আবেগ বুঝতে পারে, অনুভূতি প্রক্রিয়া এবং সঠিক প্রজন্ম। এই দুই দলের আলোচনার দৃশ্যে বিদ্যমান কাজ। তবে অনেক পার্টি ডায়ালগ বাস্তবতায় বিশাল। এছাড়াও, আবেগ এবং অনুভূতি সাধারণত বিভ্রান্ত; a refined empathy analysis is needed for comprehending fragile and nuanced human feelings.  এই গবেষণায় আমরা একটি মাল্টি পার্টি শাস্তির ডায়ালগ জেনারেশন নামের একটি উপন্যাসের প্রস্তাব দিয়ে এই বিষয়গুলোর বিষয়ে এছাড়াও, বহ-পার্টি Empathtic ডায়ালগ জেনারেশনের একটি স্টেটিক- ডায়ানামিক মডেল, এসডিএমপেড, একটি বেসাল লাইন হিসেবে পরিচিত করা হয়েছে বহ-দলের শান্তিপূর্ণ ডায়ালগ শিক্ষার জন্য স্টেটিক- ডায়ালগ শিক্ষার্থীর', 'et': 'Empaatiline dialoog koondab emotsioonide mõistmise, tunnete projektsiooni ja sobiva reageerimise genereerimise. Olemasolev töö empaatilise dialoogi genereerimiseks keskendub kahepoolsele vestlusstsenaariumile. Mitmeparteiline dialoog on aga tegelikkuses levinud. Lisaks on emotsioonid ja tundlikkus tavaliselt segaduses; habraste ja nüanssidega inimtunnete mõistmiseks on vaja täpset empaatiaanalüüsi. Me tegeleme nende probleemidega, pakkudes selles uuringus välja uue ülesande, mida nimetatakse mitmeparteiliseks empaatiliseks dialoogiks. Lisaks võetakse aluseks mitmepoolse empaatilise dialoogi genereerimise staatiline-dünaamiline mudel SDMPED, uurides mitmepoolse empaatilise dialoogi õppimise staatilist tundlikkust ja dünaamilisi emotsioone, aspekte, mis aitavad SDMPED saavutada state-of-the-art performance.', 'bs': 'Empatički dijalog skuplja emocionalno razumijevanje, projekciju osjećaja i odgovarajuću generaciju odgovora. Postojeći rad za generaciju empatičkog dijaloga usredotoči se na scenario razgovora s dvije strane. Međutim, mnogobrojni dijalogi su prošireni u stvarnosti. Osim toga, emocije i osjetljivost su obično zbunjeni; Potrebna je određena analiza empatije za razumijevanje krhkih i nuanciranih ljudskih osjećaja. Mi rješavamo te probleme predloženjem novog zadatka zvanog Generacijom multipartijskog dijaloga u ovoj studiji. Osim toga, statistički dinamički model za generaciju Empatičnog dijaloga multistranaka SDMPED se uvede kao početnu liniju istraživajući statičku osjetljivost i dinamičnu emociju za učenje empatičkog dijaloga multistranaka, aspekte koji pomažu SDMPED ostvariti stanje umjetnosti.', 'ca': "El diàleg empàtic assembla la comprensió emocional, el sentiment de projecció i la generació de resposta apropiada. La feina existent per a la generació de diàleg empàtic es concentra en l'escenari de converses de dos partits. Però els diàlegs multipartits són generalitzats en realitat. A més, l'emoció i la sensibilitat són normalment confuses; necessita una anàlisi d'empatia refinada per entendre sentiments humans fràgils i nuances. En aquest estudi abordem aquests problemes proposant una nova tasca anomenada generació de diàleg empàtic multipartit. A més, un model estatic-dinàmic per a la generació de diàleg empàtic multipartit, SDMPED, es introdueix com a base explorant la sensibilitat estatica i l'emoció dinàmica per l'aprenentatge de diàleg empàtic multipartit, els aspectes que ajuden a SDMPED a aconseguir l'actuació més avançada.", 'cs': 'Empatický dialog sestavuje porozumění emocím, projekci pocitů a vhodné generování reakcí. Stávající práce pro generování empatického dialogu se soustředí na scénář dvou stran konverzace. Vícestranné dialogy jsou však ve skutečnosti všudypřítomné. Kromě toho jsou emoce a citlivost typicky zmatené; Pro pochopení křehkých a nuancovaných lidských pocitů je nutná rafinovaná empatická analýza. Tyto otázky řešíme navržením nového úkolu s názvem Multi-Party Empathic Dialogue Generation v této studii. Kromě toho je představen staticko-dynamický model pro generování empatických dialogů více stran, SDMPED, jako základní základ zkoumáním statické citlivosti a dynamických emocí pro empatické dialogové učení více stran, aspekty, které pomáhají SDMPED dosáhnout nejmodernějšího výkonu.', 'fi': 'Empaattinen dialogi kokoaa tunteiden ymmärtämistä, tunteiden projektiota ja sopivaa vastausta. Olemassa oleva työ empaattisen dialogin luomiseksi keskittyy kaksitahoiseen keskusteluskenaarioon. Monipuoluevuoropuhelu on kuitenkin todellisuudessa laaja-alaista. Lisäksi tunteet ja herkkyys ovat tyypillisesti sekavia. Hienostunut empatiaanalyysi tarvitaan hauraiden ja vivahteikkaiden ihmisten tunteiden ymmärtämiseksi. Käsittelemme näitä kysymyksiä ehdottamalla tässä tutkimuksessa uutta tehtävää nimeltä Multi-Party Empatetic Dialogue Generation. Lisäksi Static-Dynamic model for Multi-Party Empathic Dialogue Generation, SDMPED, esitellään perustason tutkimalla staattista herkkyyttä ja dynaamisia tunteita monipuolueisen empaattisen dialogin oppimiseen, jotka auttavat SDMPED saavuttamaan huipputason suorituskyvyn.', 'jv': 'Panjenengan empatik kok nggabung kelas kuwi nesalahan, kesalahan, lan jenengan respon sing apik. ProgressBarUpdates Tambané, karo dialog sing akeh-akeh sing dirasakake Lahan luwih-luwih, sampeyan lan cuasahaan kuwi kesalapun; Rasané awak dhéwé éntuk kejahatan karo hal-hal kuwi duluran ngono ngregani uwong. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan iki dadi pawartos nggawe gerakan kelangen batir Multi-parti empati Dialog Generasi ning acara iki. Label', 'sk': 'Empatični dialog združuje razumevanje čustev, projekcijo občutkov in ustrezno ustvarjanje odzivov. Obstoječe delo za generacijo empatičnega dialoga se osredotoča na scenarij dvostranskega pogovora. Vendar so večstrankarski dialogi v resnici vsesplošni. Poleg tega sta čustva in občutljivost običajno zmedena; Za razumevanje krhkih in niansiranih človeških občutkov je potrebna prefinjena analiza empatije. Ta vprašanja obravnavamo tako, da v tej študiji predlagamo novo nalogo, imenovano Ustvarjanje večstrankarskega empatičnega dialoga. Poleg tega je kot osnovna izhodišča uveden statično-dinamični model za ustvarjanje večstrankarskega empatičnega dialoga SDMPED, ki raziskuje statično občutljivost in dinamična čustva za učenje večstrankarskega empatičnega dialoga, vidike, ki pomagajo SDMPED doseči najsodobnejšo predstavo.', 'he': 'דיאלוג אמפטי מארגן הבנה רגשית, תחושה פרוייקציה, ודור התגובה מתאים. העבודה הנוכחית לדור דיאלוג אמפטי מתמקדת בתרחיש השיחה של שתי מסיבות. בכל אופן, דיאלוגים רבים ממחלקים נמצאים ברחבי המציאות. חוץ מזה, רגשות וחושיות מבולבלות בדרך כלל; ניתוח אמפתיה מעודן נדרש כדי להבין רגשות אנושיים שבריריים ונואנסים. אנחנו מתמודדים עם הנושאים האלה בכך שאנחנו מציעים משימה חדשה שנקראת דנרציה של דיאלוג אמפטי מרובע במחלקה הזאת. בנוסף, מודל סטטי-דינמי ליצירת דיאלוג אמפטי רב-מפלגתיים, SDMPED, מוצג כבסיס על ידי חקירה של רגישות סטטית ודינמית ללמוד דיאלוג אמפטי רב-מפלגתיים, הנושאים שמעזרים SDMPED להשיג את ההופעה המוקדמת.', 'ha': "Di zauren akwatin bayani na Empty, yana tãra fahimtar hiso, ma'anar shiri da kuma ma'abũcin ajir daidai. Yi da aikin wanda ke samar wa zauren akwatin bayani na masu basu'a, yana cikin fassarar mazaɓa biyu. Haƙĩƙa, zauren akwatin bayani masu yawa na gaske ne. Furan haka, hisia da hisia za'a ƙulla su a bayan; Ana ƙayyade anayyar tamaa da ana buƙata domin ganin hisãbi na damu da nake damu. We address these issues by proposing a novel task called Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation in this study.  Ƙarawa, an introduce wani motali na Static-DNAmic wa Yaƙin Dialog na multi-Paris, SDMED, a ƙara shi kamar a ƙarƙashin kwamfyuta don ya nẽmi hisia'in static da za'a yi sauna wa karanta zauren akwatin bayanin masu multi-danne, masu taimakon SDMED ya sami halin-mai-art.", 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གིས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་། སེམས་ཚོར་འཆར་བ་དང་། མཐུན་པ་སྒྲུང་ཚོར་བསྡུར། Existing work for empathetic dialog generation focuses on the two-party conversation scenario. ཡིན་ནའང་ཡང་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་མང་གསོག་སྒྲུང་ལ་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་རེད། སེམས་ཚོར་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སླ་བས་ཀྱི་འདུག། རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཉར་འཇོག་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་དབུགས་རྩལ་ཞིབ་དག་གི་ཡོད་པས། ང་ཚོས་རེ་བ་འདི་དག་བརྩོན་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་མོལ་ཁང་ཕྱོགས་སྤེལ་བའི་ལས་ཀ་གསར་གཏོང་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Additionally, a Static-Dynamic model for Multi-Party Empathetic Dialogue Generation, SDMPED, is introduced as a baseline by exploring the static sensibility and dynamic emotion for the multi-party empathetic dialog learning, the aspects that help SDMPED achieve the state-of-the-art performance.'}
{'en': 'Towards Robustness of Text-to-', 'ar': 'MISC: نموذج مختلط مدرك للإستراتيجية يدمج COMET لمحادثات الدعم العاطفي', 'es': 'MISC: Un modelo mixto de conciencia estratégica que integra COMET para la conversación de apoyo emocional', 'pt': 'MISC: Um modelo de estratégia mista que integra o COMET para conversação de apoio emocional', 'fr': 'MISC\xa0: Un modèle sensible à la stratégie mixte intégrant COMET pour une conversation de soutien émotionnel', 'ja': 'MISC ： Mixed Strategy - Aware Model Integration COMET for Emotional Support Conversation', 'hi': 'MISC: भावनात्मक समर्थन वार्तालाप के लिए धूमकेतु को एकीकृत करने वाला एक मिश्रित रणनीति-जागरूक मॉडल', 'ru': 'РАЗНОЕ: Mixed Strategy-Aware Model Integrating COMETA for Emotional Support Conversation', 'zh': 'MISC曰:混合策略感于形,COMET情也', 'ga': 'MISC: Múnla Feasach ar Straitéis Measctha a chomhtháthaíonn COMET do Chomhrá Tacaíochta Mothúchánach', 'el': 'Ένα μικτό μοντέλο συνειδητής στρατηγικής που ενσωματώνει το COMET για τη συζήτηση συναισθηματικής υποστήριξης', 'hu': 'MISC: Vegyes stratégiatudatos modell, amely integrálja a COMET érzelmi támogatási beszélgetést', 'ka': 'MISC: შესაბამისი სტრატიგური გახსნა მოდელის ინტეგრაცია COMET ემოციონალური მხარდაჭერის პარამეტრებისთვის', 'it': 'MISC: Un Modello Misto Strategico che integra COMET per Conversazione di Supporto Emozionale', 'kk': 'MISC: Көңіл қолдау мәліметтері үшін COMET үлгісін біріктіру аралас стратегиялық қарау үлгісі', 'lt': 'MISC: Mišrus strategijos supratimo modelis, integruojantis COMET emocinės paramos konversacijai', 'mk': 'МИСК: Модел на мешана стратегија со свесност за интегрирање на COMET за преговори за емоционална поддршка', 'ml': 'MISC: ഇമോട്ടിയോളിയല്\u200d പിന്തുണയുടെ സംസാരം', 'mt': 'MISC: Mudell Mħallat ta’ Konxjenza dwar l-Istrateġija li jintegra COMET għall-Konversjoni ta’ Appoġġ Emozzjonali', 'ms': 'MISC: Model Strategi-Awas Tercampur yang menyertai COMET untuk Perbualan sokongan emosi', 'mn': 'MISC: Хүйцэтгэл дэмжлэх ярилцлагын тулд COMET-г төвлөрүүлэх төрлийн стратеги-Aware Model', 'no': 'MISC: Eit blandet strategi-vekk-modell som integrerer COMET for samtale med emosjonsstøtte', 'pl': 'MISC: Mieszany model świadomy strategii integrujący COMET dla rozmów o wsparciu emocjonalnym', 'ro': 'MISC: Un model mixt conștient de strategie care integrează COMET pentru conversația de sprijin emoțional', 'sr': 'MISC: Mešan model za razgovor o emocionalnoj podršci', 'si': 'MISC: භාවිත සහාය සමාව සම්බන්ධයක් වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය-අවස්ථාව මඩේල් එක්කරණය COMET', 'so': 'MISC: A Mixed Strategy-aware Model integration COMET for Emotional Support Conversation', 'sv': 'MISC: En blandad strategimedveten modell som integrerar COMET för samtal med känslomässigt stöd', 'ta': 'MISC: உணர்வு ஆதரவு உரையாடலுக்கான ஒரு கலக்கப்பட்ட Strategy- நன்கு தெரியும் மாதிரி ஒருங்கிணைப்பு COMET', 'ur': 'MISC: ایک مختلف استراتژی-Aware موڈل جو ایموٹیونی حمایت کی بات کے لئے COMET کو جمع کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'MISC: Mô hình giải chiến lược tổng hợp chất tổ hợp Hỗ trợ cảm xúc:', 'bg': 'МИСК: Смесен модел, осъзнаващ стратегията, интегриращ Комет за разговор за емоционална подкрепа', 'nl': 'MISC: Een gemengd strategiebewust model dat COMET integreert voor gesprekken met emotionele ondersteuning', 'da': 'MISC: En blandet strategi-bevidst model, der integrerer COMET til følelsesmæssig støtte samtale', 'hr': 'MISC: Model mešanog razmišljanja o strategiji o integraciji COMET za razgovor o emocionalnoj podršci', 'de': 'MISC: Ein Mixed Strategy-Aware Modell, das COMET für emotionale Unterstützungsgespräche integriert', 'ko': 'MISC: COMET의 감정 지원 대화 통합 정책 인식 모델', 'id': 'MISC: A Mixed Strategy-Aware Model yang mengintegrasi COMET untuk Pembicaraan Sokongan Emotional', 'fa': 'MISC: یک مدل آگاهی از استراتژی مختلف آمیزش COMET برای مکالمه پشتیبانی احساساتی', 'sw': 'MISC: Mradi wa Mpango wa Kufahamika na Mpango wa Kuunganisha COMET kwa ajili ya Mazungumzo ya Ushindi wa Kihisia', 'tr': "MISC: Emotik Destek Qonuşması için bir Karışık Strateji-Aware Modeli COMET'i integrasyon", 'af': 'MISC: 芒聙聶n gemengde Strategie-Aware Model integreer COMET vir Emotionale ondersteunde Gespraak', 'sq': 'MISC: Një model i përzier i njohur me strategjinë që integron COMET për bisedën e mbështetjes emocionale', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'ՄԻՍԿ՝ Միքսված ռազմավարական գիտակցության մոդել, որը ինտեգրում է զգացմունքային աջակցության համակարգը', 'az': 'MISC: Emotional Destek Qonuşması üçün COMET birləşdirilən Karışıqlı Strateji-Aware Modeli', 'bn': 'মিএসসি: Emotional সমর্থন কথোপকথনের জন্য একটি মিক্সেড স্ট্রেটিজ- পরিচিত মডেল', 'bs': 'MISC: Model mešanog razmišljanja o strategiji za integraciju COMET za razgovor o emocionalnoj podršci', 'ca': "MISC: Un model mixte d'estratègia conscient integrant COMET per a la conversa de suport emocional", 'et': 'MISC: Segatud strateegiateadlik mudel, mis integreerib COMETi emotsionaalseks tugivestluseks', 'cs': 'MISC: Smíšený model orientovaný na strategii integrující COMET pro konverzaci o emocionální podpoře', 'fi': 'MISC: Sekalainen strategiatietoinen malli, joka integroi COMET:n emotionaaliseen tukeen', 'jv': 'Minsc: A Mixed Astry-Awake model embeding COMETs kanggo Ngubah Jejaring', 'ha': 'MISC: An haɗi wata Model na Tsariya da aka sani', 'sk': 'MISC: Mešani model, ozaveščen o strategiji, ki vključuje COMET za pogovore o čustveni podpori', 'he': 'מודל מודע לאסטרטגיה מעורבת', 'bo': 'MISC: སྤྱིར་གཏོང་རུང་གི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ལ་Mixed Strategy-Aware Model སྒྲིག་ཆ་མཚོན་པའི་COMET(Emotional Support Conversation)'}
{'en': 'The robustness of Text-to-SQL parsers against adversarial perturbations plays a crucial role in delivering highly reliable applications. Previous studies along this line primarily focused on perturbations in the natural language question side, neglecting the variability of tables. Motivated by this, we propose the Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) as a new attacking paradigm to measure robustness of Text-to-SQL models. Following this proposition, we curate ADVETA, the first robustness evaluation benchmark featuring natural and realistic ATPs. All tested state-of-the-art models experience dramatic performance drops on ADVETA, revealing significant room of improvement. To defense against ATP, we build a systematic adversarial training example generation framework tailored for better contextualization of tabular data. Experiments show that our approach brings models best robustness improvement against ATP, while also substantially boost model robustness against NL-side perturbations. We will release ADVETA and code to facilitate future research.', 'ar': 'إن تطبيق الأساليب الحالية على محادثة الدعم العاطفي - التي توفر مساعدة قيمة للأشخاص المحتاجين - له حدان رئيسيان: (أ) يستخدمون عمومًا تصنيفًا عاطفيًا على مستوى المحادثة ، وهو أمر رديء للغاية بحيث يتعذر عليه جذب انتباه المستخدم. حالة عقلية فورية (ب) يركز معظمهم على التعبير عن التعاطف في الاستجابة (الاستجابات) بدلاً من التقليل التدريجي لضيق المستخدم. لمعالجة المشكلات ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا $ \\ textbf {MISC} $ ، والذي يستنتج أولاً الحالة العاطفية الدقيقة للمستخدم ، ثم يستجيب بمهارة باستخدام مزيج من الإستراتيجية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة البيانات المعيارية فعالية طريقتنا وتكشف عن فوائد فهم المشاعر الدقيق بالإضافة إلى نمذجة الإستراتيجية المختلطة.', 'pt': 'A aplicação de métodos existentes à conversa de apoio emocional --- que fornece assistência valiosa para pessoas que precisam --- tem duas grandes limitações: (a) geralmente empregam um rótulo de emoção no nível de conversação, que é muito grosseiro para capturar as emoções do usuário. estado mental instantâneo; (b) a maioria deles se concentra em expressar empatia na(s) resposta(s) ao invés de reduzir gradualmente o sofrimento do usuário. Para resolver os problemas, propomos um novo modelo $\\textbf{MISC}$, que primeiro infere o status emocional refinado do usuário e, em seguida, responde habilmente usando uma mistura de estratégia. Os resultados experimentais no conjunto de dados de referência demonstram a eficácia do nosso método e revelam os benefícios da compreensão detalhada das emoções, bem como da modelagem de estratégias mistas.', 'es': 'La aplicación de los métodos existentes a la conversación de apoyo emocional, que proporciona una ayuda valiosa a las personas que lo necesitan, tiene dos limitaciones principales: (a) generalmente emplean una etiqueta de emoción a nivel de conversación, que es demasiado gruesa para captar el estado mental instantáneo del usuario; (b) la mayoría de ellos se centran en expresar empatía en la (s) respuesta (s) en lugar de reducir gradualmente la angustia del usuario. Para abordar los problemas, proponemos un modelo novedoso $\\ textbf {MISC} $, que primero infiere el estado emocional detallado del usuario y luego responde hábilmente utilizando una combinación de estrategias. Los resultados experimentales en el conjunto de datos de referencia demuestran la eficacia de nuestro método y revelan los beneficios de una comprensión profunda de las emociones, así como de un modelado de estrategias confuso.', 'fr': "L'application des méthodes existantes à la conversation de soutien émotionnel — qui fournit une aide précieuse aux personnes dans le besoin — présente deux limites majeures\xa0: (a) elles utilisent généralement une étiquette d'émotion de niveau conversation, trop grossière pour saisir l'état mental instantané de l'utilisateur\xa0; (b) la plupart d'entre elles se concentrent sur exprimer de l'empathie dans la ou les réponses plutôt que de réduire progressivement la détresse de l'utilisateur. Pour résoudre les problèmes, nous proposons un nouveau modèle $\xa0\\ textbf {MISC} $, qui d'abord déduit l'état émotionnel fin de l'utilisateur, puis répond habilement en utilisant un mélange de stratégies. Les résultats expérimentaux de l'ensemble de données de référence démontrent l'efficacité de notre méthode et révèlent les avantages d'une compréhension fine des émotions ainsi que d'une modélisation stratégique mixte.", 'hi': 'भावनात्मक समर्थन वार्तालाप के लिए मौजूदा तरीकों को लागू करना--- जो उन लोगों को मूल्यवान सहायता प्रदान करता है जिन्हें आवश्यकता है--- दो प्रमुख सीमाएं हैं: (ए) वे आम तौर पर एक वार्तालाप-स्तर की भावना लेबल को नियोजित करते हैं, जो उपयोगकर्ता की तत्काल मानसिक स्थिति को पकड़ने के लिए बहुत मोटे-दाने वाले होते हैं; (बी) उनमें से अधिकांश उपयोगकर्ता के संकट को धीरे-धीरे कम करने के बजाय प्रतिक्रिया (ओं) में सहानुभूति व्यक्त करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं $\\textbf{MISC}$, जो पहले उपयोगकर्ता की ठीक-ठाक भावनात्मक स्थिति का अनुमान लगाता है, और फिर रणनीति के मिश्रण का उपयोग करके कुशलतासे प्रतिक्रिया करता है। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारी विधि की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं और ठीक-ठीक भावनाओं को समझने के साथ-साथ मिश्रित-अप रणनीति मॉडलिंग के लाभों को प्रकट करते हैं।', 'zh': '以今法用于情---这为有用者宝之助---有二要局限性:(a)其常用对语情表,当标太粗,不得用户者即时精神也。 (b)其中多专于回应,非渐减用户之苦也。 为此一新$\\textbf{MISC}$,先推用户细粒度情,然后用混合策略巧应。 准数集实验验其有效性,而发细粒度情混合策略建模之利。', 'ja': '既存の方法を感情的なサポートの会話に適用することは、困っている人々に貴重な支援を提供します。これには2つの大きな制限があります。（ a ）彼らは一般的に会話レベルの感情ラベルを採用しています。これは、ユーザーの瞬間的な精神状態を把握するには粗すぎます。（ b ）彼らのほとんどは、ユーザーの苦痛を徐々に減らすのではなく、対応における共感を表現することに焦点を当てています。問題に対処するために、私たちは新しいモデル$\\ textbf {MISC }$を提案します。これは、まずユーザーの細かい感情の状態を推測し、次に戦略の組み合わせを使用して巧みに対応します。ベンチマークデータセットの実験結果は、当社の方法の有効性を実証し、微粒子感情理解とミックスアップストラテジーモデリングの利点を明らかにします。', 'ru': 'Применение существующих методов для эмоциональной поддержки разговора - что обеспечивает ценную помощь людям, которые нуждаются - имеет два основных ограничения: (a) они, как правило, используют ярлык эмоций на уровне разговора, который слишком грубо выражен, чтобы охватить мгновенное психическое состояние пользователя; (b) большинство из них фокусируются на выражении сочувствия в ответе(ах), а не на постепенном уменьшении беспокойства пользователя. Для решения проблем мы предлагаем новую модель $\\textbf{РАЗНОЕ}$, которая сначала выводит тонкозернистый эмоциональный статус пользователя, а затем умело реагирует, используя смесь стратегии. Экспериментальные результаты по эталонному набору данных демонстрируют эффективность нашего метода и выявляют преимущества мелкозернистого понимания эмоций, а также моделирования смешанной стратегии.', 'ga': 'Tá dhá mhórtheorainn ag baint le modhanna atá ann cheana a chur i bhfeidhm ar thacaíocht mhothúchánach comhrá --- a sholáthraíonn cúnamh luachmhar do dhaoine atá i ngátar ---: (a) go ginearálta úsáideann siad lipéad mothúcháin ar leibhéal an chomhrá, atá ró-gharbh chun sonraí an úsáideora a ghabháil. staid mheabhrach an toirt; (b) díríonn an chuid is mó acu ar ionbhá a chur in iúl sa fhreagra nó sna freagraí seachas ar anacair an úsáideora a laghdú de réir a chéile. Chun dul i ngleic leis na fadhbanna, molaimid samhail nua $\\textbf{MISC}$, a thairgeann ar dtús stádas mothúchánach mínghlan an úsáideora, agus a fhreagraíonn go sciliúil ansin ag baint úsáide as meascán straitéise. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar an tacar sonraí tagarmharcála éifeachtacht ár modha agus léiríonn siad na buntáistí a bhaineann le tuiscint mhínluachmhar ar mhothúcháin chomh maith le samhaltú straitéise measctha.', 'ka': 'ემოციონალური დახმარებისთვის მიმდინარე მეტოვების გამოყენება--- რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანი დახმარება ადამიანებისთვის, რომლებიც მჭირდება--- აქვს ორი მნიშვნელოვანი განზომილებები: (b) უფრო მეტი მათგანი განახსენებაზე იყოს ემპატაციის გამოსახულებაზე, ვიდრე განახულებაში მომხმარებლის ბედნიერება. პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ პრობლემების პრობლემა $\\textbf{MISC}$, რომელიც პირველად მომხმარებელი მომხმარებელი ემოციონალური სტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატის შესახებ ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ ჩვენი მეტის ეფექტიურობის გამოყენება და გამოჩვენება ემოციონის მოსახულებების გამოსახულება, რომლებიც შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია', 'el': 'Η εφαρμογή των υφιστάμενων μεθόδων στη συζήτηση συναισθηματικής υποστήριξης -η οποία παρέχει πολύτιμη βοήθεια στους ανθρώπους που έχουν ανάγκη- έχει δύο μεγάλους περιορισμούς: (α) χρησιμοποιούν γενικά μια ετικέτα συναισθημάτων-επιπέδου συνομιλίας, η οποία είναι πολύ χονδροειδής για να συλλάβει τη στιγμιαία ψυχική κατάσταση του χρήστη. (β) οι περισσότεροι από αυτούς επικεντρώνονται στην έκφραση συμπάθειας στην απάντηση (τις) αντί να μειώνουν σταδιακά την αγωνία του χρήστη. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν τα προβλήματα, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο $\\textbf{MISC}$, το οποίο αρχικά συμπεραίνει την λεπτή συναισθηματική κατάσταση του χρήστη και στη συνέχεια ανταποκρίνεται επιδέξια χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μείγμα στρατηγικής. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου μας και αποκαλύπτουν τα οφέλη της λεπτόκοκκης κατανόησης συναισθημάτων καθώς και της μικτής μοντελοποίησης στρατηγικής.', 'hu': 'A meglévő módszerek alkalmazása az érzelmi támogató beszélgetésre --amely értékes segítséget nyújt a rászoruló embereknek --két fő korlátja van: (a) általában egy beszélgetési szintű érzelmi címkét alkalmaznak, amely túl durva szemű ahhoz, hogy rögzítse a felhasználó azonnali mentális állapotát; b) a legtöbbjük inkább az empátia kifejezésére összpontosít a válasz(ok)ban, ahelyett, hogy fokozatosan csökkentené a felhasználó aggodalmát. A problémák kezelésére javasoljuk a $\\textff{MISC}$modellt, amely először a felhasználó finom szemcsés érzelmi státuszát következteti le, majd ügyesen reagál stratégia keverékével. A benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják módszerünk hatékonyságát és feltárják a finomszemcsés érzelmek megértésének és a vegyes stratégiai modellezésnek az előnyeit.', 'it': "L'applicazione dei metodi esistenti alla conversazione di supporto emotivo --- che fornisce assistenza preziosa alle persone che ne hanno bisogno --- ha due limitazioni principali: (a) generalmente utilizzano un'etichetta emotiva a livello di conversazione, che è troppo grossolana per catturare lo stato mentale istantaneo dell'utente; (b) la maggior parte di essi si concentra sull'esprimere empatia nella risposta o nelle risposte piuttosto che ridurre gradualmente il disagio dell'utente. Per affrontare i problemi, proponiamo un nuovo modello $\\textff{MISC}$, che prima deduce lo stato emotivo fine dell'utente e poi risponde abilmente utilizzando una miscela di strategia. I risultati sperimentali sul set di dati di benchmark dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro metodo e rivelano i benefici della comprensione delle emozioni a grana fine e della modellazione della strategia mista.", 'lt': 'Esamų metodų taikymas emocinės paramos pokalbiui, kuris teikia vertingą pagalbą žmonėms, kuriems reikia, turi du pagrindinius apribojimus: a) jie paprastai naudoja pokalbio lygio emocinę etiketę, kuri yra per didelė, kad sugebėtų sugauti naudotojo akivaizdžią psichinę būklę; b) dauguma jų daugiausia dėmesio skiria užuot palaipsniui mažin ę naudotojo nelaimę, išreikšti užuojautą atsako (-ų) srityje. Siekiant išspręsti problemas, pasiūlome naują model į $\\textbf{MISC}$, kuris pirmiausia daro išvadą, kad naudotojas turi puikų emocinį status ą, o vėliau įgūdingai reaguoja naudojant strategijos mišinį. Eksperimentiniai lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinio rezultatai rodo mūsų metodo veiksmingumą ir atskleidžia puikios emocijos supratimo bei mišrios strategijos modeliavimo naudą.', 'mk': 'Примената на постојните методи на разговорот за емоционална поддршка -- кој обезбедува вредна помош за луѓето кои имаат потреба -- има две главни ограничувања: (a) тие генерално користат емоционална етикета на ниво на разговор, која е премногу груба за да ја фатат митманната ментална состојба на корисникот; (b) повеќето од нив се фокусираат на изразување на емпатија во одговорот(ите) наместо постепено намалување на нервите на корисникот. За да ги решиме проблемите, предложуваме нов модел $\\textbf{MISC}$, кој прво го инферира фино-корисникот емоционалниот статус, а потоа одговара вештински користејќи мешавина на стратегија. Експерименталните резултати на базата на податоци покажуваат ефективност на нашиот метод и ги откриваат бенефициите од фино разумевање на емоциите, како и мешано моделирање на стратегијата.', 'kk': 'Мынау әдістерді эмоциялық қолдау сұхбаттарына қолдану--- бұл қажетті адамдарға көмек береді--- екі негізгі шектері бар: a) олар әдетте сұхбат деңгейіндегі эмоциялық жарлығын қолданылады, бұл пайдаланушының мезгілд (b) олардың көпшілігі пайдаланушының көпшілігін көмектесу орнына жауап(лар) мен көпшілігін көмектесу үшін көмектеседі. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, біріншіден пайдаланушының эмоциялық күйін түсіндіру үшін $\\textbf{MISC}$ үлгісін таңдаймыз. Содан кейін стратегия араластырып жауап береді. Деректер бағдарламасының эксперименталдық нәтижелері әдісіміздің ефективнігін көрсетеді және дұрыс емоциялық түсініктердің және аралас стратегиялық модель үлгісін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Melakukan kaedah yang wujud untuk percakapan sokongan emosional---yang menyediakan bantuan yang berharga kepada orang yang memerlukan---mempunyai dua keterangan utama: (a) mereka biasanya menggunakan label emosi aras percakapan, yang terlalu kasar untuk menangkap keadaan mental segera pengguna; (b) kebanyakan mereka fokus pada mengekspresikan empati dalam balasan daripada mengurangi kesusahan pengguna secara perlahan-lahan. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami cadangkan model baru $\\textbf{MISC}$, yang pertama-tama menyimpulkan status emosional pengguna yang sempurna, dan kemudian menjawab dengan berbakat menggunakan campuran strategi. Keputusan percubaan pada set data benchmark menunjukkan keefektivitas kaedah kita dan mengungkapkan keuntungan pemahaman emosi yang baik serta model strategi campuran.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള സംസാരം പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാനുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു- ആവശ്യമുള്ള ആളുകള്\u200dക്ക് വിലപ്പെട്ട സഹായം നല്\u200dകുന്നു- ആവശ്യമുള്ളവര്\u200dക്ക് രണ്ട (b) അവരില്\u200d അധികപേരും ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ദുരിതത്തെ സാവധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d ക്ഷമ പ്രകടമായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കു പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, ആദ്യം ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സുന്ദരന്മാരുടെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d $ ടെക്സ്റ്റ്ബുഫ് {MISC}$ നാം പ്രാ ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ പ്രവർത്തനവും കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. നല്ല വികാരങ്', 'mt': 'L-applikazzjoni tal-metodi eżistenti għall-konverżjoni ta’ appoġġ emozzjonali---li tipprovdi assistenza prezzjuża lil persuni fil-bżonn---għandha żewġ limitazzjonijiet ewlenin: (a) ġeneralment jużaw tikketta emozzjonali fil-livell ta’ konverżjoni, li hija magħquda wisq biex tinqabad l-istat mentali istantanju tal-utent; (b) il-biċċa l-kbira tagħhom jiffokaw fuq l-espressjoni tal-empatija fir-rispons(i) minflok inaqqsu gradwalment id-diffikultà tal-utent. Biex nindirizzaw il-problemi, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid $\\textbf{MISC}$, li l-ewwel jikkonkludi l-istatus emozzjonali fin-grained tal-utent, u mbagħad jirrispondi b’mod ħieles bl-użu ta’ taħlita ta’ strateġija. Riżultati esperimentali dwar is-sett ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru l-effettività tal-metodu tagħna u jiżvelaw il-benefiċċji ta’ fehim emozzjonali bir-reqqa kif ukoll mudell ta’ strateġija mħallta.', 'mn': 'Хэрэгтэй хүмүүст үнэ цэнэтэй тусламжтай тусламжтай арга хэрэглэх нь хоёр чухал хязгаар байдаг: a) тэд ерөнхийдөө ярианы түвшинд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загварыг ашигладаг. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчийн сэтгэл санааны байдлыг барьж чадах хэтэрхий төвөгтэй. (b) ихэнх нь хэрэглэгчийн зовлонг багасгахын оронд хариулт(ууд) дээр илэрхийлж байгааг анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Олон асуудлуудыг бодохын тулд бид шинэ загвар $\\textbf{MISC}$ гэсэн санал өгдөг. Эхлээд хэрэглэгчийн сайхан сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай нөлөөлдөг бөгөөд дараа нь урам зориулалтыг ашиглаж чадвартай хариулт өгдө Бидний аргын үр дүнг харуулж, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн ойлголтын үр дүнг харуулж, мөн цуглуулсан стратегийн загварчлалын үр дүнг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Bruk eksisterande metodar til emosjonell støtte samtale --- som tilbyr verdilege hjelp til menneske som treng --- har to stor grenser: a) dei brukar generelt ein samtalenivå emosjonell etikett, som er for uttrykk for å henta brukaren synleg mentalt tilstand. (b) dei fleste fokuserer på å uttrykke empatikk i svaret(ane) i staden for å redusera gradvis brukaren av trussen. For å handtere problemene, foreslår vi eit nytt modell $\\textbf{MISC}$, som først inferer brukaren sine fyrste emosjonske status, og s å reagerer på ein mønster av strategi. Eksperimentale resultat på datasettet for benchmarket demonstrerer effektiviteten av metoden vårt og oppdager fordelene av fylkorne emosjonsforståelse og blandemodulen av strategi.', 'pl': 'Stosowanie istniejących metod do rozmowy emocjonalnej – która zapewnia cenną pomoc ludziom potrzebującym – ma dwa główne ograniczenia: (a) zazwyczaj stosuje etykietę emocji na poziomie konwersacji, która jest zbyt gruboziarnista, aby uchwycić natychmiastowy stan psychiczny użytkownika; (b) większość z nich skupia się na wyrażaniu empatii w reakcjach, a nie stopniowym zmniejszaniu niepokoju użytkownika. Aby rozwiązać problemy, proponujemy nowatorski model $\\textbf{MISC}$, który najpierw wnioskuje drobnoziarnisty status emocjonalny użytkownika, a następnie umiejętnie reaguje przy użyciu mieszanki strategii. Wyniki eksperymentalne na zestawie danych referencyjnych pokazują skuteczność naszej metody i ujawniają korzyści płynące z precyzyjnego zrozumienia emocji oraz modelowania strategii mieszanej.', 'ro': 'Aplicarea metodelor existente conversației de sprijin emoțional --- care oferă asistență valoroasă persoanelor care au nevoie --- are două limitări majore: (a) în general utilizează o etichetă emoțională la nivel de conversație, care este prea grosieră pentru a capta starea mentală instantanee a utilizatorului; (b) majoritatea dintre ele se concentrează pe exprimarea empatiei în răspunsul (răspunsurile) mai degrabă decât pe reducerea treptată a stresului utilizatorului. Pentru a rezolva problemele, propunem un nou model $\\textff{MISC}$, care deduce mai întâi starea emoțională fină a utilizatorului și apoi răspunde cu pricepere folosind un amestec de strategie. Rezultatele experimentale ale setului de date de referință demonstrează eficiența metodei noastre și dezvăluie beneficiile înțelegerii emoțiilor fine, precum și modelării strategiei mixte.', 'sr': 'Primjenjivanje postojećih metoda emocionalnom razgovoru o podršci--- koja pruža vrijednu pomoć ljudima koji su potrebni--- ima dve velike ograničenja: a) oni obično koriste emocionalnu etiketu na nivou razgovora, koja je previše oštrina da bi uhvatila trenutno mentalno stanje korisnika; b) većina njih se fokusira na izražavanje empatije u odgovoru(ima) umjesto postupnog smanjenja nevolje korisnika. Da bi se riješili problemi, predlažemo novi model $\\textbf{MISC}$, koji prvo zarađuje dobro zrno emocionalni status korisnika, a onda odgovara veoma koristeći mješavinu strategije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o referenciji pokazuju učinkovitost našeg metoda i otkrivaju koristi dobrog razumevanja emocija, kao i modeliranja kombiniranih strategija.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් භාවිතය සහය සම්බන්ධ කතා කරන්න---ඒකෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විශාල උදව්වයක් දෙන්න ඕනි මිනිස්සුන්ට---ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශාලිත සීමාවක් දෙකක (b) ඔවුන්ගේ ගොඩක් අවධානය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය කරනවා $\\textbf{MISC}$, මුලින්ම පාවිච්චි කරුණාකරුවාගේ හොඳ ප්\u200dරශ්න ස්ථිතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරත බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සූදානයේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් වගේම', 'so': 'Codsashada qaababka joogta ah oo ay u sameynayaan hadalka caawimaadda qofka u baahan--kaas oo u fidiya caawimaad qiimo leh dadka u baahan---waxay leeyihiin laba xadhig oo muhiim ah: (a) waxay u shaqeeyaan calaamada heerka hadalka, taas oo aad u kooban tahay in uu qabsado xaaladda dhimirka ah ee isticmaalaha; (b) Inta badan oo iyaga ka mid ah waxay ku kalsoonaadaan inay u jeedaan raxmadda jawaabta ee ay si taxadar ah ugu hoosaystiraan dhibaatada isticmaalaha. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatooyinka, waxaan soo jeedaynaa qoraalka $\\buugaag ee qoraalka, $MISC}$, kaas oo ugu horeysa ku dhibaataysa isticmaalaha darajada dhaqaalaha hissiga, kadibna si fiican ugu jawaabayo isticmaalka qoraalka isku xiran. Experimental results on the benchmark dataset demonstrate the effectiveness of our method and reveal the benefits of fine-grained emotion understanding as well as mixed-up strategy modeling.', 'sv': 'Att tillämpa befintliga metoder på känslomässigt stöd konversation --- som ger värdefull hjälp till människor som är i behov --- har två stora begränsningar: (a) de använder i allmänhet en konversationsnivå känsloetikett, som är för grovkornig för att fånga användares omedelbara mentala tillstånd; (b) De flesta av dem fokuserar på att uttrycka empati i svaren snarare än gradvis minska användarens ångest. För att lösa problemen föreslår vi en ny modell $\\textff{MISC}$, som först härleder användarens finkorniga känslomässiga status och sedan svarar skickligt med hjälp av en blandning av strategi. Experimentella resultat på benchmarkdatauppsättningen visar hur effektiv vår metod är och avslöjar fördelarna med finkornig känsloförståelse samt blandad strategimodellering.', 'ta': 'உணர்வு ஆதரவு பேசும் முறைகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது -- அது தேவைப்படும் மக்களுக்கு மதிப்புரிய உதவி வழங்குகிறது -- இரண்டு முக்கிய எல்லைகள்: (a) அவர்கள் பொதுவாக பேசும் மட்ட உணர்வு  (b) அவர்களில் பெரும்பாலானவர்கள் பயனரின் துன்பத்தை வெளிப்படையாக குறைக்கும் பதில்களில் உணர்வை வெளிப்படுத்தும பிரச்சனைகளை விளக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரியை $\\textbf {MISC}$ பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது முதலில் பயனரின் நல்ல பிடித்த உணர்வு நிலையை பாதிக்கும், பி பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தின் சோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'مصنوعی حمایت کی صحبت کے لئے موجود طریقے استعمال کرتے ہیں--- جو لوگوں کے لئے جو نیاز ہیں ان کے لئے ارزش دار مدد دیتا ہے--- دو بڑے حدود ہیں: a) وہ عموماً ایک صحبت-سطح احساسات لیبل استعمال کرتے ہیں، جو بہت زیادہ مصنوعی ہے کہ کارساز کی جگہ مصنوعی حالت کو پکڑنے کے لئے (b) ان میں اکثر لوگ جواب دینے کے لئے مہربانی کا مطالبہ کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ بلکہ ان میں سے اکثر لوگ مہربانی کا مطالبہ کم کرنا چاہتے ہیں۔ مشکلات کے بارے میں ہم نے ایک نوم موڈل $\\textbf{MISC}$ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جو پہلی بار یوسف کے نیک غلام کے احساسات موقعیت کے مطابق اضافہ کرتا ہے، اور پھر استراتژی کا مزہ استعمال کرتا ہے. بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ ہمارے طریقے کا اثرات دکھاتا ہے اور نیک دانے کے احساسات سمجھنے کے فائدہ دکھاتا ہے اور ملحق استراتژی موڈلینگ کے فائدہ دکھاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Mavjud usullarni qoʻllash - bu qo'shish kerakli odamlarga qiymati yordam beradi ---- ikkita muhim chegaralarni qo'llash mumkin:(a) ular odatda foydalanuvchining shaxsiy holatini qabul qilish uchun juda ko'p qo'llaniladi; (b) ularning ko'pchiligi foydalanuvchilarning hayotini taqdim ko'paytirishdan foydalanuvchiga imkoniyatlarni anglashga foydalanadi. Muammolarni talab qilish uchun, biz foydalanuvchiga ajratilgan hisob holatini o'zgartiradigan novel modelini $ textb $ talab qilamiz va keyin strategiya bir qanday qanday bir qanday javob beradi. Benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari metodimizning effektligini ko'rsatadi va yaxshi qo'llangan hissiyotlar imkoniyatining faqatlarini va birlashtirilgan strategiya modelini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Sử dụng phương pháp hiện có cho cuộc đối thoại hỗ trợ cảm xúc..., hỗ trợ đáng giá cho những người đang cần..., có hai giới hạn lớn: B) Phần lớn tập trung vào việc thể hiện s ự đồng cảm trong phản ứng thay vì giảm đau đớn dần dần. Để giải quyết các vấn đề, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình mới huống huống huống huống huống huống huống huống đầu tiên là kết luận trạng thái tinh thần hưng phấn của người dùng, rồi trả lời khéo léo s ử dụng một hỗn hợp chiến lược. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp này và tiết lộ lợi ích của sự hiểu biết cảm xúc sâu sắc, cũng như khả năng mô tả chiến lược tổng hợp.', 'bg': 'Прилагането на съществуващи методи за разговор с емоционална подкрепа - което осигурява ценна помощ на хората, които имат нужда - има две основни ограничения: (а) те обикновено използват етикет на емоция на ниво разговор, който е твърде грубозърнест, за да улови моментното умствено състояние на потребителя; б) повечето от тях се фокусират върху изразяването на съпричастност в отговора(ите), вместо постепенно намаляване на дистреса на потребителя. За да се справим с проблемите, предлагаме нов модел $\\textbf{MISC}$, който първо извежда финото емоционално състояние на потребителя и след това умело реагира, използвайки смесица от стратегия. Експерименталните резултати от сравнителния набор от данни демонстрират ефективността на нашия метод и разкриват ползите от финото разбиране на емоциите, както и смесеното моделиране на стратегиите.', 'nl': 'Het toepassen van bestaande methoden op emotionele ondersteuning conversatie-die waardevolle hulp biedt aan mensen die in nood zijn--heeft twee belangrijke beperkingen: (a) ze gebruiken over het algemeen een conversatie-niveau emotie label, dat te grof is om de onmiddellijke mentale toestand van de gebruiker vast te leggen; (b) de meeste van hen richten zich op het uiten van empathie in de respons(s) in plaats van geleidelijk het leed van de gebruiker te verminderen. Om de problemen aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw model $\\textbf{MISC}$voor, dat eerst de fijnkorrelige emotionele status van de gebruiker afleidt, en vervolgens vakkundig reageert met behulp van een mix van strategie. Experimentele resultaten op de benchmark dataset tonen de effectiviteit van onze methode aan en onthullen de voordelen van fijngranig begrip van emoties en gemengde strategiemodellering.', 'da': 'Anvendelse af eksisterende metoder til følelsesmæssig støtte samtale --- som giver værdifuld hjælp til mennesker, der er i nød --- har to store begrænsninger: (a) de anvender generelt en samtale-niveau følelsesmærke, som er for grov-kornet til at fange brugerens øjeblikkelige mentale tilstand; (b) de fleste af dem fokuserer på at udtrykke empati i reaktionerne i stedet for gradvist at reducere brugerens angst. For at løse problemerne foreslår vi en ny model $\\textff{MISC}$, som først udleder brugerens finkornede følelsesmæssige status og derefter reagerer dygtigt ved hjælp af en blanding af strategi. Eksperimentelle resultater på benchmarkdatasættet viser effektiviteten af vores metode og afslører fordelene ved finkornet følelsesforforståelse samt blandet strategimodellering.', 'hr': 'Primjenjivanje postojećih metoda emocionalnom razgovoru o potpori--- koja pruža vrijednu pomoć ljudima koji su potrebni--- ima dvije velike ograničenja: a) oni obično koriste emocionalnu etiketu na razgovoru razgovora, koja je previše oštrina da bi uhvatila trenutno mentalno stanje korisnika; (b) većina njih se fokusira na izražavanje empatije u odgovoru(ima) umjesto postupno smanjenje nevolje korisnika. Da bi se riješili problemi, predlažemo nov model $\\textbf{MISC}$, koji prvo zarađuje dobro zrno emocionalni status korisnika, a onda odgovara na vještine koristeći mješavinu strategije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o referenciji pokazuju učinkovitost našeg metoda i otkrivaju koristi dobro razumijevanja emocija, kao i modeliranja kombiniranih strategija.', 'ko': '기존의 방법을 감정 지원 대화에 응용하는 것은 필요한 사람에게 가치 있는 도움을 제공하는 데 두 가지 주요한 한계가 있다. (a) 그들은 보통 대화 단계의 감정 라벨을 사용하는데 너무 거칠어서 사용자의 즉각적인 심리 상태를 포착할 수 없다.(b) 그들 대부분은 사용자의 고통을 점차 줄이는 것이 아니라 응답에서 동조심을 표현하는 데 전념한다.이러한 문제점을 해결하기 위해 $\\textbf{MISC}$새로운 모델을 제시했습니다. 이 모델은 사용자의 세립도 정서 상태를 먼저 추정한 다음에 혼합 전략을 사용하여 교묘하게 응답합니다.기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과는 이 방법의 유효성을 증명하고 세립도 정서 이해와 혼합 전략 모델링의 장점을 제시했다.', 'de': 'Die Anwendung bestehender Methoden auf emotionale Unterstützungsgespräche – die Menschen in Not wertvolle Hilfe bietet – hat zwei wesentliche Einschränkungen: (a) sie verwenden im Allgemeinen ein Emotionslabel auf Konversationsebene, das zu grobkörnig ist, um den sofortigen mentalen Zustand des Benutzers zu erfassen; (b) Die meisten von ihnen konzentrieren sich darauf, Empathie in der Antwort(en) auszudrücken, anstatt die Belastung des Benutzers schrittweise zu verringern. Um die Probleme anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neuartiges Modell $\\textbf{MISC}$vor, das zunächst den feinkörnigen emotionalen Status des Benutzers ableitet und dann geschickt mit einer Mischung von Strategien reagiert. Experimentelle Ergebnisse auf dem Benchmark-Datensatz zeigen die Effektivität unserer Methode und zeigen die Vorteile von feingranularem Emotionsverständnis sowie gemischter Strategiemodellierung auf.', 'fa': 'استفاده از روش\u200cهای موجود برای گفتگوی پشتیبانی احساساتی---که برای مردم که نیاز دارند، کمک ارزشمند را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد-- دو محدودیت بزرگی دارند: a) آنها عموماً یک نقاشی احساسات سطح گفتگو را استفاده می\u200cکنند، که خیلی زیادی غذایی برای گرفتن وضعیت ذهنی استفاده کننده است. (b) بیشترشان روی نمایش همدلی در پاسخ(ها) تمرکز می\u200cکنند به جای تخفیف اندوه کاربر. برای حل مشکلات، ما یک مدل رمانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم $\\textbf{MISC}$، که اول موقعیت احساساتی خوبی از استفاده کننده را آلوده می\u200cکند، سپس با استفاده از یک ترکیب استراتژی به طور مهارت پاسخ می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای مقدار مقدار نشان می\u200cدهد که موثرت روش ما را نشان می\u200cدهد و سودهای درک احساسات قطعی و مدل\u200cسازی استراتژی مختلف را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Kutumia mbinu zilizopo kwa ajili ya mazungumzo ya hisia ya kuunga mkono -ambayo hutoa msaada wa thamani kwa watu wanaohitaji ---ana vizuizi viwili vikuu: (a) kwa ujumla wanatumia alama ya hisia za mazungumzo, ambayo ni muhimu sana kupata hali ya kisaikolojia ya mtumiaji; (b) Wengi wao wakijikita kwenye kuonyesha huruma za kujibu badala ya kupunguza taratibu za watumiaji. Ili kukabiliana na matatizo, tunapendekeza muundo wa riwaya $\\textbook {MISC}$, ambao kwa mara ya kwanza unaathiri hali ya hisia iliyopo vizuri, na kisha anajibu kwa ujumla kwa kutumia mchanganyiko wa mkakati. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti ya taarifa za bendera yanaonyesha ufanisi wa njia yetu na kuonyesha faida za kuelewa vizuri vizuri pamoja na mipango ya mikakati ya mchanganyiko.', 'tr': 'Öň bar yöntemleri duýdury gürrüňlemek üçin ullanýar---bu ýoly gerekli adamlara deň kömek berer---iň iki esasy meseleleri bar: (a) olar dünýäde gürrüňlemek derejesi duýdury etiketini ulanýarlar, onuň usulçynyň derrew garşy durumyny ýaramak üçin gaty bejerilmez. (b) Olaryň köpüsi özüniň kynçylygyny azaltmakdan öňünde empatiýany aýdyp bermek üçin üns berýärler. Meseleleri çözmek üçin, biz roman nusgasyny $\\textbf{MISC}$ teklip edip, bu iň başlangyçda qullanıcıň iň gowy görnüş duýuşy durumyny alyp barýar we soňra stratejiýanyň karışmagyny ulanyp ukyply jogap berýäris. Demirgazyk dataýasynyň netijesi biziň metodamyzyň etkinliýetini görkezýär we gowy görnüş duýgynyň düşünüşiniň we karmaşdyrylygy strategiýa modelleýäniň etkinliýetini görkezýär.', 'af': "Die toepassing van bestaande metodes aan emosionele ondersteunde gesprek---wat waardelik assistent verskaf aan mense wat in nodigheid is---het twee groot beperking: (a) hulle gebruik algemeen 'n gesprek-vlak emosie etiket, wat is te korrse-graan om die gebruiker se oomblik mentale staat te vang; (b) meeste van hulle fokus op die uitdrukking van gemagtigheid in die antwoord(s) eerder as gradief verduur van gebruiker se benoudheid. Om die probleme te adres, voorstel ons 'n roman model $\\textbf{MISC}$, wat eerste die gebruiker se fyn-koring emosionele status inferer, en dan reageer verstandig met 'n gemenging van strategie. Eksperimentale resultate op die benchmarkdatastel vertoon die effektiviteit van ons metode en vertoon die voordele van fyn-koring emosie verstanding en gemengde strategie modeling.", 'sq': 'Aplikimi i metodave ekzistuese ndaj bisedimeve të mbështetjes emocionale -- që ofron ndihmë të vlefshme për njerëzit që janë në nevojë -- ka dy kufizime të mëdha: (a) ata përgjithësisht përdorin një etiketë emocionale të nivelit të bisedimeve, e cila është shumë e ashpër për të kapur gjendjen mentale të menjëhershme të përdoruesit; (b) shumica prej tyre përqëndrohen në shprehjen e empatisë në përgjigjen (përgjigjet) në vend të reduktimit gradual të vështirësisë s ë përdoruesit. Për të trajtuar problemet, ne propozojmë një model të ri $\\textbf{MISC}$, i cili s ë pari përfshin statusin emocional të përdoruesit dhe pastaj reagon me aftësi duke përdorur një përzierje strategjie. Rezultatet eksperimentale në bazën e të dhënave tregojnë efektshmërinë e metodës sonë dhe zbulojnë përfitimet e mirëkuptimit të emocioneve si dhe modelimit të strategjisë së përzier.', 'am': "የአሁኑን ዓይነት ለመስማት ድጋፍ ለመጠቀም - ለሚያስፈልጉት - ሁለት ትልቁ ግንኙነት አለባቸው:- a) በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ የንግግር-ደረጃ እውቀት ማድረግ ይሞክራሉ፡፡ (b) አብዛኞቻቸው የተጠቃሚውን ጭንቀት በጥቅልቅ ለማሳሳየት የሚለውን ድህነትን በማሳየት ላይ ማምለክ ነው፡፡ To address the problems, we propose a novel model $\\textbf{MISC}$, which firstly infers the user's fine-grained emotional status, and then responds skillfully using a mixture of strategy.  በbenchmark ዳታዎች ላይ የመፈተና ውጤቶች የሥርዓታችንን ጥቃት እና የተመሳሰለውን የስህተት ማስተዋልን እና የተቀላቀለውን የስታተኝነትን ምሳሌ ማሳየት ያሳያል፡፡", 'id': 'Menggunakan metode yang ada untuk percakapan dukungan emosional -- yang menyediakan bantuan yang berharga bagi orang yang membutuhkan -- memiliki dua batasan utama: (a) mereka umumnya menggunakan label emosi tingkat percakapan, yang terlalu kasar untuk menangkap keadaan mental instant pengguna; (b) kebanyakan mereka fokus pada mengekspresikan empati dalam respon(nya) daripada mengurangi kesedihan pengguna secara perlahan-lahan. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan model baru $\\textbf{MISC}$, yang pertama-tama menyimpulkan status emosional pengguna yang sempurna, dan kemudian merespon dengan berbakat menggunakan campuran strategi. Experimental results on the benchmark dataset demonstrate the effectiveness of our method and reveal the benefits of fine-grained emotion understanding as well as mixed-up strategy modeling.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդներ կիրառելը զգացմունքային աջակցության զրույցի համար, որը արժեքավոր օգնություն է տալիս մարդկանց, ովքեր կարիք ունեն, ունի երկու կարևոր սահմանափակումներ. a) նրանք ընդհանուր առմամբ օգտագործում են զգացմունքային պիտակ, որը չափազանց ծանր է օգտա b) նրանցից շատերը կենտրոնանում են կարեկցանքի արտահայտության վրա արձագանքի մեջ, ոչ թե աստիճանաբար նվազեցնելու օգտագործողի տառապանքը: Խնդիրներին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք $\\TexBf{MICS}$ նոր մոդել, որը առաջին հերթին հանգեցնում է օգտագործողի գեղեցիկ զգացմունքային կարգավիճակին և հետո հմտությամբ արձագանքում է, օգտագործելով ռազմավարության խառնուրդ: Համեմարկյան տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը և բացահայտում են բարձրացված զգացմունքների հասկացության առավելությունները, ինչպես նաև խառնված ռազմավարության մոդելավորումը:', 'az': 'İhtiyacı olan insanlara çox qiymətli yardım verir: a) onlar genellikle müzakirə-seviyyətli emosiyal etiketini istifadə edirlər, bu istifadəçin in dərhal ruhsal durumunu tutmaq üçün çox çətin-çətinlikdir. ( b) onların əksəriyyəti istifadəçin in s ıxıntısını azaltmaq yerinə cavabında şəfaət göstərməyə odaqlanır. Problemləri çəkmək üçün yeni modeli $\\textbf{MISC}$ təklif edirik. Bu, ilk dəfə istifadəçinin gözəl dənəli emosiyal durumunu dağıtır və sonra müxtəlif bir strateji müxtəlif istifadə edir. Benchmark veri qutusundakı təcrübə sonuçları metodumuzun etkinliğini göstərir və düzgün hiss anlayışının və müxtəlif strateji modelinin faydalarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'অনুভূতির সমর্থন আলোচনার জন্য বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করা হচ্ছে - যা প্রয়োজনীয় লোকদের জন্য মূল্যবান সাহায্য প্রদান করে - যাদের প্রয়োজন- তাদের দুই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সীমাবদ্ (b) তাদের বেশীরভাগ ব্যবহারকারীর দুর্দশা ধীরে কমানোর পরিবর্তে সহানুভূতি প্রকাশের প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। সমস্যার কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস মডেল $\\টেক্সটফ {মিএসসি}$ প্রস্তাব করি, যা প্রথমে ব্যবহারকারীর সুন্দর আচরণের স্ট্যাটাসের আক্রান্ত হয়েছে, তারপর তা Experimental results on the benchmark dataset demonstrate the effectiveness of our method and reveal the benefits of fine-grained emotion understanding as well as mixed-up strategy modeling.', 'bs': 'Primjenjivanje postojećih metoda emocionalnom razgovoru o podršci---koja pruža vrijednu pomoć ljudima koji su potrebni---ima dvije velike ograničenja: a) oni obično koriste emocionalnu etiketu na nivou razgovora, koja je previše oštrina da bi uhvatila trenutno mentalno stanje korisnika; b) većina njih se fokusira na izražavanje empatije u odgovoru(ima) umjesto postupno smanjenje nevolje korisnika. Da bi se riješili problemi, predlažemo novi model $\\textbf{MISC}$, koji prvo inferira dobro zrno emocionalni status korisnika, a onda odgovara vještno koristeći mješavinu strategije. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o referenciji pokazuju učinkovitost našeg metoda i otkrivaju koristi dobrog razumijevanja emocija, kao i modeliranja kombiniranih strategija.', 'ca': "L'aplicació de mètodes existents a la conversa de suport emocional, que proporciona una valuable assistència a la gent que necessita, té dues limitacions importants: a) utilitzen generalment una etiqueta emocional de nivell de conversa, que és massa grossa per capturar l'estat mental instantani de l'usuari; b) la majoria s'enfoca en expressar empatia en la resposta(s) en comptes de reduir gradualment l'angoix de l'usuari. Per abordar els problemes, proposem un nou model $\\textbf{MISC}$, que en primer lloc infereix l'estatus emocional de l'usuari, i després respon amb habilitat fent servir una combinació d'estratègies. Experimental results on the benchmark dataset demonstrate the effectiveness of our method and reveal the benefits of fine-grained emotion understanding as well as mixed-up strategy modeling.", 'et': 'Olemasolevate meetodite rakendamisel emotsionaalse toetuse vestluses, mis pakub väärtuslikku abi vajavatele inimestele, on kaks peamist piirangut: a) tavaliselt kasutavad nad vestlustasemel emotsionaalset sildit, mis on liiga jämeda teravusega, et jäädvustada kasutaja hetkeseisund; b) enamik neist keskendub empaatia väljendamisele vastuses, mitte kasutaja stressi järkjärgulisele vähendamisele. Probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja uudse mudeli $\\textbf{MISC}$, mis esmalt järeldab kasutaja peene emotsionaalne staatus ja seejärel reageerib oskuslikult strateegia segu abil. Võrdlusandmete eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad meie meetodi efektiivsust ja näitavad peeneteraalse emotsioonide mõistmise ja segatud strateegia modelleerimise eeliseid.', 'cs': 'Použití existujících metod na emoční podporu konverzace – která poskytuje cennou pomoc lidem, kteří jsou v nouzi – má dvě hlavní omezení: (a) obecně používají emoční etiketu na úrovni konverzace, která je příliš hrubozrnná na to, aby zachytila okamžitý duševní stav uživatele; (b) většina z nich se zaměřuje na vyjádření empatie v reakci (reakcích) spíše než na postupné snižování úzkosti uživatele. Pro řešení problémů navrhujeme nový model $\\textbf{MISC}$, který nejprve odvozuje jemný emoční stav uživatele a poté dovedně reaguje směsí strategie. Experimentální výsledky na benchmarkovém datu ukazují efektivitu naší metody a odhalují výhody jemného porozumění emocím a smíšeného modelování strategií.', 'fi': 'Olemassa olevien menetelmien soveltamisella emotionaaliseen tukikeskusteluun – joka tarjoaa arvokasta apua tarvitseville – on kaksi suurta rajoitusta: (a) he käyttävät yleensä keskustelutason tunnemerkintää, joka on liian karkea käyttäjän välittömän mielentilan kuvaamiseksi; (b) useimmat niistä keskittyvät empatian ilmaisemiseen vastauksessa (vastauksissa) sen sijaan, että vähitellen vähennettäisiin käyttäjän ahdistusta. Ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta mallia $\\textbf{MISC}$, joka ensin päättelee käyttäjän hienorakeisen emotionaalisen tilan ja sitten reagoi taitavasti käyttämällä strategiaa. Kokeelliset tulokset vertailuaineistosta osoittavat menetelmämme tehokkuuden ja paljastavat hienorakeisen tunteiden ymmärtämisen sekä sekastrategian mallintamisen edut.', 'ha': "Suna amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu iya amfani da mazaɓa -wanda ke bãyar da taimako mai kima ga mutane da ke cikin muhimma------, yana da tsari biyu masu girma: (a) suna amfani da alama mai sauran hisãbi da ke samu'a, wanda yana da kuma ana sami ko-na-ƙunsa dõmin ka kãma halin misali na mai amfani da shi; (b) mafi yawansu sun fokus a kan su nuna samaki ga majibu ko kuma b ã ya ƙara cũtar da mai amfani da kwamfyuta. To, dõmin a yi tambaya ga masu zartar da su, sai mu buƙata wani motsi na nowaya $ littãfin na $ na rubutu, wanda ke ƙara shi farkon ya yi zartar da matsayin fani mai tsari na masu amfani da shi, sa'an nan kuma ana karɓa mai kyau game da wani misãlai na sakan. Tajararin matsalar a kan danne-bangon ayuka na nuna aikin hanyarmu kuma ya bayyana amfani ga fahimtar hisia mai kyau da sami da sami-sami da misalin-sami-sami.", 'sk': 'Uporaba obstoječih metod za pogovor o čustveni podpori, ki zagotavlja dragoceno pomoč ljudem, ki potrebujejo pomoč, ima dve glavni omejitvi: (a) običajno uporabljajo oznako čustev na ravni pogovora, ki je preveč groba, da bi zajeli uporabnikovo takojšnje duševno stanje; (b) večina se osredotoča na izražanje empatije v odzivu(-ih), namesto da postopno zmanjšuje stisko uporabnika. Za reševanje problemov predlagamo nov model $\\textbf{MISC}$, ki najprej ugotavlja drobnozrnat čustveni status uporabnika, nato pa se spretno odzove z mešanico strategije. Eksperimentalni rezultati referenčnih podatkov kažejo učinkovitost naše metode in razkrivajo prednosti drobnozrnatega razumevanja čustev ter mešanega modeliranja strategije.', 'he': 'שימוש שיטות קיימות לשיחה בתמיכה רגשית -- אשר מספק עזרה ערובה לאנשים שזקוקים -- יש שני מגבלות גדולות: (a) הם בדרך כלל משתמשים בתווית רגשות ברמה השיחה, שהיא גסה מדי כדי לתפוס מצב נפשי מיידי של המשתמש; (b) רובם מתמקדים בבטא אמפתיה בתגובה(ים) במקום להפחית באופן שליטי את המצוקה של המשתמש. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיות, אנו מציעים מודל חדש $\\textbf{MISC}$, אשר קודם ממסקן את המצב הרגשי של המשתמש, ומתגיב במיומנות באמצעות שילוב של אסטרטגיה. תוצאות ניסיוניות על קבוצת נתונים של רמז מראות את היעילות של השיטה שלנו ולחשוף את היתרונות של הבנה רגשית מעורבת כמו גם מודל אסטרטגיה מעורבת.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱད་ནས་སྐད་ཆ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་གཏམ་གླེང་བ་ལ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་པ---དེ་ནི་དགོས་མཁན་པའི་མི་མང་ཆེ་བ་གཉིས་ཡོད། (b) འདི་མང་ཆེ་བ་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་གམ་གཤིས་ཀྱི་དབུགས་རྐྱེན་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་གདོང་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསར་བའི་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་བ $\\textbf{MISC}$ ཅིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experimental results on the benchmark dataset demonstrate the effectiveness of our method and reveal the benefits of fine-grain emotion understanding as well as mixed-up strategy modeling.', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngilangno sistem sing misingan kanggo nggunakake tarjamahan omongaké ---sing nyimpen ijol-ijolan soalé kanggo ngilangno dhéwé ---wis limitasi duruh sing dibenakno:(a) sing ngomong gunakake etiket sing beraksi tambahan lan nambah sing apik, sing wis nggawe nguasakno dianggap kanggo ngakpa gerakan. (b) luwih akeh sing dipun ngomong nik nggambarang empati nang gambarang(ing) kuwi mesthi dadi nggawe nguasai tentang. kanggo nganggo perkoro, kita ndhukung ngomong modèl kuwi $textbf {MAYC} Rejalaké sing paling nggambar dadi nggawe bener tentang bakal nggambar kang nggawe sistem sing nyimpen iki bakal nggawe bener neng kuwi tindakan ngerasakno sing apik tur angel.'}
{'en': 'Metaphors in Pre-Trained Language Models: Probing and Generalization Across Datasets and Languages', 'ar': 'GLM: نموذج اللغة العامة التدريب المسبق باستخدام ملء الفراغ الذاتي', 'pt': 'GLM: Pré-treinamento do Modelo de Linguagem Geral com Preenchimento Autoregressivo em Branco', 'fr': 'GLM\xa0: Préapprentissage du modèle linguistique général avec remplissage autorégressif des blancs', 'es': 'GLM: Preentrenamiento de modelos de lenguaje general con relleno autorregresivo de espacios en blanco', 'ja': 'GLM ：自動回帰ブランク充填による一般言語モデルの事前トレーニング', 'zh': 'GLM:用自归空白填充者,以语言预习之', 'hi': 'GLM: सामान्य भाषा मॉडल Autoregressive रिक्त Infilling के साथ Pretraining', 'ru': 'GLM: Общая языковая модель предварительного обучения с авторегрессивным заполнением пробелов', 'ga': 'GLM: Réamhoiliúint sa tSamhail Teanga Ghinearálta le Líonadh Neamhchúlaithe Uathchéimnitheach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Γενική προετοιμασία προτύπου γλώσσας με αυτόματη κενή πλήρωση', 'hu': 'GLM: Általános nyelvi modell előadás automatikus üres befolyással', 'it': 'GLM: Pretraining del modello linguistico generale con riempimento automatico automatico', 'lt': 'GLM: Bendrasis kalbos modelis Paruošimas su automatiškai regresiniu tuščiu uždegimu', 'kk': 'GLM: Автогрессивні бос инфилинг арналған жалпы тіл үлгісі', 'mk': 'GLM: Генерален јазички модел преправање со авторегресивно празно инфликање', 'ms': 'GLM: Model Bahasa Umum Membuat Pretraining dengan Autoregressive Blank Infilling', 'ml': 'ജിഎല്\u200dഎം: സ്വയം രേഖപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ശൂന്യമായി പൊതുവായ ഭാഷ മോഡില്\u200d പരിശീലനം', 'mt': 'GLM: Mudell Ġenerali ta’ Lingwa ta’ Tħarriġ bil-Infilling Blank Awtoregressiv', 'mn': 'GLM: Олон хэл загвар автоregressive Blank Infilling', 'no': 'GLM: General Language Model Pretraining with Autoregressive Empty Infilling', 'pl': 'GLM: Ogólne szkolenie modelu językowego z autoregresywnym napełnianiem pustych plików', 'ro': 'GLM: Model de limbă generală pretinzând cu inflamarea automată a golului', 'si': '@ info', 'sr': 'GLM: Generalni jezički model pretvaranje sa autoregresivnim praznim upaljenjem', 'so': 'GLM: Waxbarashada qaababka luqada ee guud ee iskuulka ah', 'sv': 'GLM: Allmän språkmodell som låtsas med autoregressiv blank inflyllning', 'ta': 'GLM: தன்னியக்கமாக கட்டுப்பாடு வெற்று நிரப்பும் பொது மொழி மாதிரி பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'GLM: عمومی زبان موڈل اٹوگریسٹی خالی انفالینگ کے ساتھ پرٹرین', 'uz': 'GLM: Umumiy til modeli', 'vi': 'GLM: Kiểu ngôn ngữ chung Hình thức giả với ảnh phủ trắng tự hủy', 'bg': 'Претрениране на общ езиков модел с авторегресивно празно пълнене', 'da': 'GLM: Generel sprogmodel foregiver med autoregressiv blank indførsel', 'nl': 'GLM: Algemene Taalmodel Voortraining met autoregressieve lege vulling', 'hr': 'GLM: Generalni jezički model pretvaranje sa autoregresivnim praznim propalicama', 'de': 'GLM: Allgemeine Sprachmodellvorbereitung mit autoregressiver Leerbefüllung', 'id': 'GLM: General Language Model Pretraining with Autoregressive Blank Infilling', 'ko': 'GLM: 회귀 공백으로 채워진 유니버설 언어 예비 트레이닝 모델', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'GLM: General Language Model Pretraining with Autoregressive Blank Infilling', 'af': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'tr': 'GLM: Otomatik regressiv Boş Infilling ile Umumiy Dil Modeli', 'sq': 'GLM: Modeli i Gjuhave të Përgjithshme duke pretenduar me Autoregressive Blank Infilling', 'am': 'GLM: General language Model Pretraining with autoregressive Blank Infilling', 'hy': 'ԳԼՄ: Գեներալ լեզվի մոդելը ինքնառեգրեսիվ դատարկ ներխուժման դեպքում', 'az': 'GLM: Autoregressive Blank Infilling ilə General Dil Modeli', 'bn': 'GLM: স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাষার মোডেল স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ফাঁকা ইনফিল করার সাথে প্রশিক্ষণ', 'bs': 'GLM: Generalni jezički model pretvaranje sa autoregresivnim praznim upaljenjem', 'cs': 'GLM: Předtrénování obecného jazykového modelu s autoregresivním prázdným plněním', 'ca': 'GLM: Model general de llenguatge pretenent amb inflació blanca autoregressiva', 'et': 'GLM: Üldise keelemudeli eeltreening koos automaatse tühja täitmisega', 'fi': 'GLM: Yleinen kielimallin esikoulutus automaattisella tyhjällä täyttöllä', 'jv': 'GLM: General Language model Presing', 'sk': 'GLM: Predvajanje splošnega jezikovnega modela s samoregresivnim praznim polnjenjem', 'he': 'GLM: מודל שפה גנרלית מתאמן עם אוטורגרסיבי ריק', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'GLM: སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་མ་དབྱིབས་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱེད་པ་དང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་བཞག་ནུས་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Human languages are full of metaphorical expressions. Metaphors help people understand the world by connecting new concepts and domains to more familiar ones. Large pre-trained language models (PLMs) are therefore assumed to encode metaphorical knowledge useful for NLP systems. In this paper, we investigate this hypothesis for PLMs, by probing metaphoricity information in their encodings, and by measuring the cross-lingual and cross-dataset generalization of this information. We present studies in multiple metaphor detection datasets and in four languages (i.e., English, Spanish, Russian, and Farsi). Our extensive experiments suggest that contextual representations in PLMs do encode metaphorical knowledge, and mostly in their middle layers. The knowledge is transferable between languages and datasets, especially when the annotation is consistent across training and testing sets. Our findings give helpful insights for both cognitive and NLP scientists.', 'ar': 'كانت هناك أنواع مختلفة من هياكل التدريب المسبق بما في ذلك نماذج التشفير التلقائي (على سبيل المثال ، BERT) ونماذج الانحدار التلقائي (مثل GPT) ونماذج وحدة فك التشفير (على سبيل المثال ، T5). ومع ذلك ، لا يؤدي أي من أطر التدريب المسبق الأداء الأفضل لجميع المهام من الفئات الرئيسية الثلاث بما في ذلك فهم اللغة الطبيعية (NLU) والتوليد غير المشروط والتوليد المشروط. نقترح نموذجًا للغة عامة (GLM) يعتمد على ملء الفراغ التلقائي للتصدي لهذا التحدي. يعمل GLM على تحسين التدريب المسبق لملء الفراغ عن طريق إضافة ترميزات موضعية ثنائية الأبعاد والسماح بترتيب تعسفي للتنبؤ بالامتدادات ، مما يؤدي إلى مكاسب في الأداء على BERT و T5 في مهام NLU. وفي الوقت نفسه ، يمكن اختبار GLM لأنواع مختلفة من المهام عن طريق تغيير عدد وأطوال الفراغات. في مجموعة واسعة من المهام عبر NLU ، والتوليد المشروط وغير المشروط ، يتفوق GLM على BERT و T5 و GPT نظرًا لنفس أحجام النماذج والبيانات ، ويحقق أفضل أداء من نموذج واحد مُدرب مسبقًا بمعلمات 1.25 × من BERT Large ، مما يدل على ذلك قابلية التعميم على مهام المصب المختلفة.', 'es': 'Ha habido varios tipos de arquitecturas de preentrenamiento, incluidos modelos de autocodificación (por ejemplo, BERT), modelos autorregresivos (por ejemplo, GPT) y modelos de codificador-decodificador (por ejemplo, T5). Sin embargo, ninguno de los marcos de preentrenamiento funciona mejor para todas las tareas de tres categorías principales, incluida la comprensión del lenguaje natural (NLU), la generación incondicional y la generación condicional. Proponemos un Modelo de Lenguaje General (GLM) basado en el llenado autorregresivo de espacios en blanco para abordar este desafío. GLM mejora el preentrenamiento de llenado de espacios en blanco al agregar codificaciones posicionales 2D y permitir un orden arbitrario para predecir los intervalos, lo que se traduce en mejoras de rendimiento con respecto a BERT y T5 en las tareas de NLU. Mientras tanto, el GLM se puede entrenar previamente para diferentes tipos de tareas variando el número y la longitud de los espacios en blanco. En una amplia gama de tareas en NLU, generación condicional e incondicional, GLM supera a BERT, T5 y GPT con los mismos tamaños de modelo y datos, y logra el mejor rendimiento con un solo modelo preentrenado con 1,25 veces los parámetros de BERT Large, lo que demuestra su generalización a diferentes tareas.', 'pt': 'Existem vários tipos de arquiteturas de pré-treinamento, incluindo modelos de autocodificação (por exemplo, BERT), modelos autorregressivos (por exemplo, GPT) e modelos de codificador-decodificador (por exemplo, T5). No entanto, nenhuma das estruturas de pré-treinamento apresenta o melhor desempenho para todas as tarefas de três categorias principais, incluindo compreensão de linguagem natural (NLU), geração incondicional e geração condicional. Propomos um General Language Model (GLM) baseado no preenchimento autoregressivo em branco para enfrentar esse desafio. O GLM melhora o pré-treinamento de preenchimento em branco adicionando codificações posicionais 2D e permitindo uma ordem arbitrária para prever spans, o que resulta em ganhos de desempenho sobre BERT e T5 em tarefas NLU. Enquanto isso, o GLM pode ser pré-treinado para diferentes tipos de tarefas variando o número e o comprimento dos espaços em branco. Em uma ampla gama de tarefas em NLU, geração condicional e incondicional, o GLM supera BERT, T5 e GPT com os mesmos tamanhos e dados de modelo e alcança o melhor desempenho de um único modelo pré-treinado com parâmetros de 1,25 × do BERT Large, demonstrando sua generalização para diferentes tarefas a jusante.', 'fr': "Il existe différents types d'architectures de pré-apprentissage, notamment des modèles d'encodage automatique (par exemple BERT), des modèles autorégressifs (par exemple, GPT) et des modèles codeur-décodeur (par exemple, T5). Cependant, aucun des cadres de pré-formation ne fonctionne le mieux pour toutes les tâches de trois catégories principales, y compris la compréhension du langage naturel (NLU), la génération inconditionnelle et la génération conditionnelle. Nous proposons un modèle linguistique général (GLM) basé sur le remplissage autorégressif de pièces brutes pour relever ce défi. GLM améliore le pré-apprentissage du remplissage des blancs en ajoutant des codages de position 2D et en permettant un ordre arbitraire pour prédire les plages, ce qui se traduit par des gains de performance par rapport au BERT et au T5 sur les tâches NLU. Pendant ce temps, GLM peut être préentraîné pour différents types de tâches en faisant varier le nombre et la longueur des blancs. Pour un large éventail de tâches de génération NLU, conditionnelle et inconditionnelle, GLM surpasse BERT, T5 et GPT avec les mêmes tailles de modèle et données, et obtient les meilleures performances à partir d'un seul modèle préentraîné avec 1,25 paramètres de BERT Large, démontrant ainsi sa généralisabilité à différents en aval tâches.", 'ja': '自動符号化モデル（例えば、ＢＥＲＴ ）、自動回帰モデル（例えば、ＧＰＴ ）、及びエンコーダデコーダモデル（例えば、Ｔ ５ ）を含む、様々なタイプの事前訓練アーキテクチャが存在してきた。 しかし、プレトレーニングフレームワークのいずれも、自然言語理解（ NLU ）、無条件生成、および条件付き生成を含む3つの主要なカテゴリのすべてのタスクに対して最良のパフォーマンスを発揮しません。 この課題に対処するために、自動回帰空白充填に基づいた一般言語モデル（ GLM ）を提案します。 GLMは、2 D位置エンコーディングを追加し、任意の順序でスパンを予測できるようにすることで、ブランク充填の事前トレーニングを改善します。これにより、NLUタスクのBERTおよびT 5よりもパフォーマンスが向上します。 一方、GLMは、ブランクの数と長さを変えることによって、さまざまなタイプのタスクのために事前に訓練することができます。 条件付きおよび無条件生成を含むNLU全体の幅広いタスクで、GLMは同じモデルサイズとデータを持つBERT、T 5、およびGPTを上回り、BERT Largeの1.25 ×パラメータを持つ単一の事前訓練済みモデルから最高のパフォーマンスを達成し、異なるダウンストリームタスクへの一般化性を実証します。', 'zh': '有各种类型之预架构,自编码(,BERT),自归(,GPT)与编码器 - 解码器(,T5)。 然无一预训练框架凡三大要,自然语言解(NLU),无条件生成也。 立一本于空填充之语(GLM)以应之。 GLM 加 2D 位编码许以次第占之跨度以充预训练,以 NLU 任重于 BERT T5 。 GLM以变空数,以应众务。 NLU、资、无条件之广务,GLM 与给定同大小、数优于 BERT、T5 、 GPT,而以 BERT Large 1.25× 参数之最,明其可推广性也。', 'hi': 'ऑटोएनकोडिंग मॉडल (जैसे, BERT), autoregressive मॉडल (जैसे, GPT), और एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल (जैसे, T5) सहित विभिन्न प्रकार के प्रीट्रेनिंग आर्किटेक्चर रहे हैं। हालांकि, प्रीट्रेनिंग फ्रेमवर्क में से कोई भी प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ (एनएलयू), बिना शर्त पीढ़ी और सशर्त पीढ़ी सहित तीन मुख्य श्रेणियों के सभी कार्यों के लिए सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन नहीं करता है। हम इस चुनौती को संबोधित करने के लिए autoregressive रिक्त infilling पर आधारित एक सामान्य भाषा मॉडल (GLM) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। GLM 2D स्थितीय एन्कोडिंग जोड़कर और स्पैन की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक मनमाना आदेश की अनुमति देकर रिक्त भरने के पूर्वप्रशिक्षण में सुधार करता है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप एनएलयू कार्यों पर BERT और T5 पर प्रदर्शन लाभ होता है। इस बीच, जीएलएम को रिक्त स्थान की संख्या और लंबाई को अलग करके विभिन्न प्रकार के कार्यों के लिए पूर्वनिर्धारित किया जा सकता है। एनएलयू, सशर्त और बिना शर्त पीढ़ी में कार्यों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला पर, जीएलएम एक ही मॉडल आकार और डेटा को देखते हुए BERT, T5 और GPT को मात देता है, और BERT लार्ज के 1.25× पैरामीटर के साथ एक एकल प्रीट्रेन्ड मॉडल से सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जो विभिन्न डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए अपनी सामान्यता का प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Существуют различные типы архитектур предварительного обучения, включая модели автокодирования (например, BERT), модели авторегрессии (например, GPT) и модели кодировщик-декодер (например, T5). Тем не менее, ни одна из структур предварительного обучения не выполняет наилучшим образом для всех задач трех основных категорий, включая понимание естественного языка (NLU), безусловную генерацию и условную генерацию. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем Общую лингвистическую модель (ОЛМ), основанную на авторегрессивном заполнении пробелов. GLM улучшает предварительное обучение пустой заливки, добавляя 2D позиционные кодировки и позволяя произвольному порядку предсказывать диапазоны, что приводит к повышению производительности по сравнению с BERT и T5 в задачах NLU. Между тем, GLM может быть предварительно обучен для различных типов задач путем изменения количества и длины пробелов. По широкому спектру задач в NLU, условной и безусловной генерации, GLM превосходит BERT, T5 и GPT при одинаковых размерах модели и данных и достигает наилучшей производительности от одной предварительно обученной модели с параметрами 1,25× BERT Large , демонстрируя ее обобщаемость к различным задачам ниже по потоку.', 'ga': 'Bhí cineálacha éagsúla ailtireachtaí réamhoiliúint ann lena n-áirítear samhlacha uath-ionchódaithe (m.sh., BERT), samhlacha uath-aischéimnitheacha (m.sh., GPT), agus samhlacha ionchódóra-díchódóra (m.sh., T5). Mar sin féin, ní fheidhmíonn aon cheann de na creataí réamhoiliúna is fearr do gach tasc de na trí phríomhchatagóir lena n-áirítear tuiscint teanga nádúrtha (NLU), giniúint neamhchoinníollach, agus giniúint choinníollach. Molaimid Samhail Ghinearálta Teanga (GLM) a bheidh bunaithe ar inlíonadh folamh uathchéimnitheach chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dúshlán seo. Feabhsaíonn GLM réamhoiliúint líonadh bán trí ionchóduithe suímh 2D a chur leis agus ordú treallach a cheadú chun raonta a thuar, rud a fhágann gnóthachain feidhmíochta thar BERT agus T5 ar thascanna NLU. Idir an dá linn, is féidir GLM a réamhoiliúint le haghaidh cineálacha éagsúla tascanna trí líon agus fad na mbearnaí a athrú. Maidir le raon leathan tascanna ar fud NLU, giniúint choinníollach agus neamhchoinníollach, sáraíonn GLM BERT, T5, agus GPT de bharr na méideanna múnla agus na sonraí céanna, agus baineann sé an fheidhmíocht is fearr amach ó shamhail réamh-oilte aonair le paraiméadair 1.25 × de BERT Large , ag taispeáint a ginearálú do thascanna éagsúla iartheachtacha.', 'hu': 'Különböző típusú előkészítő architektúrák léteztek, beleértve az autokódolási modelleket (pl. BERT), az autoregresszív modelleket (pl. GPT), és a kódoló-dekódoló modelleket (pl. T5). Azonban az előkészítési keretrendszerek egyike sem teljesíti a legjobban a három fő kategóriába tartozó feladatokat, beleértve a természetes nyelv megértését (NLU), a feltétel nélküli generálást és a feltételes generálást. A kihívás megoldásához egy autoregresszív üres betöltésen alapuló általános nyelvi modellt (GLM) javasolunk. A GLM javítja az üres kitöltés előkészítését 2D pozíciókódolások hozzáadásával, és lehetővé teszi a tartományok előrejelzésének tetszőleges sorrendjét, ami teljesítménynövekedést eredményez a BERT és T5 NLU feladatok esetében. Eközben a GLM előkészíthető különböző típusú feladatokhoz az üres tárgyak számának és hosszának változtatásával. Az NLU-n belüli feladatok széles skáláján, feltételes és feltétel nélküli generálásban a GLM ugyanazon modellméretek és adatok mellett túllép a BERT, T5 és GPT-n, és a legjobb teljesítményt egyetlen előképzett, BERT Large 1,25* paramétereivel rendelkező modellből éri el, bizonyítva, hogy általánosíthatóak a különböző downstream feladatokra.', 'el': 'Υπήρξαν διάφοροι τύποι αρχιτεκτονικών προεπεξεργασίας, συμπεριλαμβανομένων μοντέλων αυτόματης κωδικοποίησης (π.χ., BERT), μοντέλων αυτοανακλαστικής (π.χ., GPT) και μοντέλων κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών (π.χ., T5). Ωστόσο, κανένα από τα πλαίσια προετοιμασίας δεν αποδίδει το καλύτερο για όλα τα καθήκοντα τριών βασικών κατηγοριών, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της κατανόησης φυσικής γλώσσας (ΝLU), της άνευ όρων δημιουργίας και της υπό όρους δημιουργίας. Προτείνουμε ένα Γενικό Μοντέλο Γλωσσών (ΓΛΜ) βασισμένο σε αυτοανακριτική κενή συμπλήρωση για την αντιμετώπιση αυτής της πρόκλησης. Το βελτιώνει την προεπιλογή κενού πλήρωσης προσθέτοντας 2κωδικοποιήσεις θέσης και επιτρέποντας σε μια αυθαίρετη σειρά για την πρόβλεψη των διαστάσεων, η οποία έχει ως αποτέλεσμα κέρδη απόδοσης έναντι των BERT και T5 σε εργασίες NLU. Εν τω μεταξύ, μπορεί να προετοιμαστεί για διαφορετικούς τύπους εργασιών με τη διαφοροποίηση του αριθμού και του μήκους των κενών. Σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα εργασιών σε όλο το φάσμα της δημιουργίας υπό όρους και άνευ όρων, το GLM ξεπερνά τα BERT, T5 και GPT με τα ίδια μεγέθη και δεδομένα μοντέλου και επιτυγχάνει την καλύτερη απόδοση από ένα μόνο προκαθορισμένο μοντέλο με παραμέτρους 1.25* του αποδεικνύοντας τη γενικότητά του σε διαφορετικές μεταγενέστερες εργασίες.', 'ka': 'არსებობენ განსხვავებული ტიპები აქტიქტიკურები, რომელიც ავტოკოდირების მოდელები (მაგალითად, BERT), ავტორეგრესიური მოდელები (მაგალითად, GPT) და კოდირების მოდელები (მაგალითად, T5). მაგრამ, არსებობს სამი მნიშვნელოვანი კატეგორიების ყველაზე საუკეთესო პარამეტრებისთვის, რომლებიც საბავშირი ენის განსხვავებას (NLU), არსებობითი განსხვავებას და შემდეგ განსხვავ ჩვენ უნდა დავიწყებთ საერთო ენერგიის მოდელი (GLM) ავტორეგრესიგურაციული ცარიელი ინფლიგურაციისთვის, რომელიც ამ გამოცდილებას გადაწყვება. Name Meanwhile, GLM can be pretrained for different types of tasks by varying the number and length of blanks. უფრო დიდი მოდელი და მონაცემების განმავლობაში GLM გავაკეთება BERT, T5 და GPT, რომელიც იგივე მოდელური ზომის და მონაცემების განმავლობაში, და მიიღება უფრო დიდი მოდელური მოდელზე, რომელიც 1.25* BERT დიდი პარამეტრების პერამეტრებით, რომელიც განსხვავებული', 'it': "Ci sono stati vari tipi di architetture di pre-formazione tra cui modelli di codifica automatica (ad esempio BERT), modelli autoregressivi (ad esempio GPT) e modelli encoder-decoder (ad esempio T5). Tuttavia, nessuno dei framework di pre-formazione esegue il meglio per tutti i compiti di tre categorie principali, tra cui la comprensione del linguaggio naturale (NLU), la generazione incondizionata e la generazione condizionale. Proponiamo un modello linguistico generale (GLM) basato su riempimento automatico automatico regressivo per affrontare questa sfida. GLM migliora il pretraining del riempimento in bianco aggiungendo codifiche posizionali 2D e consentendo un ordine arbitrario di prevedere gli intervalli, con conseguente aumento delle prestazioni rispetto a BERT e T5 sulle attività NLU. Nel frattempo, GLM può essere pre-addestrato per diversi tipi di attività variando il numero e la lunghezza di spazi vuoti. Su un'ampia gamma di attività in NLU, generazione condizionale e incondizionata, GLM supera BERT, T5 e GPT con le stesse dimensioni e dati del modello e ottiene le migliori prestazioni da un singolo modello pre-addestrato con parametri 1,25* di BERT Large, dimostrando la sua generalizzabilità a diverse attività a valle.", 'kk': 'Автокодеу үлгілері (мысалы, BERT), авторегрессивні үлгілер (мысалы, GPT) және кодер- декодер үлгілері (мысалы, T5) деген түрлі архитектуралар бар. Бірақ бұл бағдарламалардың бұл үш негізгі санаттарының барлық тапсырмаларында, тәуелді тілді түсініктемесі (НLU), шартсыз құрылуы және шартсыз құрылуы мүмкін емес. Бұл мәселелерді өзгерту үшін авторегрессивні бос белгілеріне негізделген жалпы тіл үлгісін (GLM) таңдаймыз. GLM 2D орналасатын кодтамасын қосу үшін бос толтыруды жақсы көтереді және NLU тапсырмаларында BERT және T5 жұмыс істеу үшін бос орналасатын кодтамасын өзгертеді. Осы уақытта, GLM тапсырмалардың саны мен ұзындығын өзгертуге болады. NLU көптеген тапсырмалардың көптеген аумағында, шарт және шартсыз құрылғылар болмаса, GLM BERT, T5 және GPT бір модель өлшемі мен деректерді келтіріп тұрады, және 1, 25* BERT үлкен параметрлерінің ең жақсы әрекеттерін жеткізеді, олардың жалпы түрлі төмендету тап', 'mk': 'Постојат различни видови на претренирачки архитектури, вклучително и модели за автокодирање (на пример, BERT), авторегресни модели (на пример, GPT) и модели за кодер-декодирање (на пример, T5). Сепак, ниту еден од претренирачките рамки не е најдобар за сите задачи на три главни категории, вклучувајќи го и природното разбирање на јазикот (НЛУ), безусловна генерација и условна генерација. Предложуваме генерален јазик модел (GLM) базиран на авторегресивно празно внесување за решавање на овој предизвик. GLM го подобрува празното претренирање со додавање на дводмерни позиционални кодирања и овозможување на арбитрален ред за предвидување на растојанијата, што резултира со зголемување на резултатите над BERT и T5 на задачите на NLU. Во меѓувреме, GLM може да се претренира за различни типови на задачи со разлика на бројот и должината на празни места. На широк опсег на задачи низ НЛУ, условна и безусловна генерација, ГЛМ го надминува БЕРТ, Т5 и ГПТ со оглед на истите големини и податоци на моделот и ја постигнува најдобрата резултат од еден предобучен модел со 1,25* параметри на БЕРТ Голем , демонстрирајќи ја својата генерализација на различни понатамош', 'lt': 'Buvo įvairių rūšių išankstinio mokymo architektūros, įskaitant automatinio kodavimo modelius (pvz., BERT), autoregresinius modelius (pvz., GPT) ir kodavimo ir dekodizavimo modelius (pvz., T5). However, none of the pretraining frameworks performs the best for all tasks of three main categories including natural language understanding (NLU), unconditional generation, and conditional generation.  Siekiant spręsti šį iššūkį, siūlome bendrąjį kalbos modelį (GLM), pagrįstą autoregresiniu tuščiu įjungimu. GLM pagerina tuščio užpildymo išankstinį mokymą pridėdama 2D pozicijos kodus ir leidžiant savavališkai numatyti intervalus, dėl kurių NLU užduočių rezultatai didesni nei BERT ir T5. Tuo tarpu GLM gali būti iš anksto mokoma įvairių rūšių užduotims, skiriant tuščių vietų skaičių ir ilgius. Įgyvendinant įvairias užduotis, susijusias su NLU, sąlygine ir besąlygine generacija, GLM pasiekia BERT, T5 ir GPT rezultatus, atsižvelgiant į tokius pačius modelio dydžius ir duomenis, ir pasiekia geriausius rezultatus taikant vieną iš anksto apmokytą model į su 1,25* BERT Large parametrais, įrodančius, kad jis yra plačiai paplitęs įvairioms tolesnėms užduotims.', 'ms': 'Terdapat berbagai jenis arkitektur pretraining termasuk model auto-pengekodan (cth., BERT), model autoregressif (cth., GPT), dan model pengekod-pengekod (cth., T5). Bagaimanapun, tiada bingkai pralatihan melaksanakan yang terbaik untuk semua tugas tiga kategori utama termasuk pemahaman bahasa alam (NLU), generasi tanpa syarat, dan generasi bersyarat. Kami cadangkan Model Bahasa Umum (GLM) berdasarkan penyelesaian kosong autoregresif untuk mengatasi cabaran ini. GLM meningkatkan penuhian pratolakan kosong dengan menambah pengekodan kedudukan 2D dan membenarkan perintah arbitrari untuk meramalkan jangkauan, yang mengakibatkan keuntungan prestasi atas BERT dan T5 pada tugas NLU. Sementara itu, GLM boleh dilatih untuk jenis tugas berbeza dengan mengubah bilangan dan panjang kosong. Pada julat yang luas tugas di seluruh NLU, generasi syarat dan tanpa syarat, GLM melampaui BERT, T5, dan GPT memberikan saiz model dan data yang sama, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik dari model tunggal yang dilatih sebelum dilatih dengan parameter 1.25* BERT Besar , menunjukkan keseluruhannya kepada tugas turun yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'സ്വയമോക്കോഡിങ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള ആർക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200d പ്രചരിപ്പിക്കുന്നു However, none of the pretraining frameworks performs the best for all tasks of three main categories including natural language understanding (NLU), unconditional generation, and conditional generation.  ഈ ചാലവിളി വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d സ്വയം നിര്\u200dബന്ധിച്ച് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d (ജിഎല്\u200dഎം) പ്രൊദാനം ചെയ് രണ്ടു ഡി പോസിഷന്\u200d കോഡിങുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ജിഎല്\u200dഎം ശൂന്യമായ നിറയ്ക്കുന്നത് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. സ്പേനുകള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു ആർട്ടി അതിനിടയില്\u200d, ജിഎല്\u200dഎം വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേറെയും നീളം വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതിനായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ NLU മുഴുവന്\u200d വിശാലമായ ജോലികളില്\u200d ജിഎല്\u200dഎം ബെര്\u200dട്ടി, ടി5, ജിപിടി ഒരേ മോഡലിന്റെ വലിപ്പവും ഡേറ്റായും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട്ടി വലിയ പാര്\u200dമീറ്ററുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രദര്\u200dശനവും പ്', 'no': 'Det har vært forskjellige typar trekkingsarkitektur med autokodingsmodeller (f.eks. BERT), autoregressiv modeller (f.eks. GPT) og kodingsmodeller (f.eks. T5). Ikkje nokon av dei områdande rammeområda utfører det beste for alle oppgåver i tre hovudkategoriar, inkludert naturleg språk-forståelse (NLU), utvilkårleg generering og kondicionalt generering. Vi foreslår eit generell språk- modell (GLM) basert på autoregressivt tomt infilling for å handtera denne utfordringen. GLM forbetrar tomt fyllingsområde ved å leggja til 2D- posisjonskodingar og tillata ein tilfeldig rekkefølgje for å foregå mellomrom, som resulterer i utføringsfargen over BERT og T5 på NLU- oppgåver. Med mellomtida kan GLM trekkast for ulike typar oppgåver ved å variera talet og lengda på tomme. På eit brett rekke oppgåver gjennom NLU, kondicionalt og ubekondicionalt generering, GLM utfører BERT, T5 og GPT gjev samme modellstorleik og data, og oppnår det beste utviklinga frå ein enkelt modell med 1,25* parametrar av BERT Stor, som viser det generelliserte til ulike nedstrekkoppgåver.', 'mn': 'Мөн автокодлох загвар (жишээ нь BERT), авторегрессийн загвар (жишээ нь GPT) болон кодлох загвар (жишээ нь T5) гэх мэт олон төрлийн архитектурууд байдаг. Гэхдээ байгалийн хэл ойлголт (НLU), шаардлагагүй үеийн, шаардлагатай үеийн бүх даалгавруудын хамгийн сайн ажил хийдэггүй. Бид энэхүү сорилтыг зохицуулахын тулд авторегрессивний хоосон доторх ерөнхий хэл загварын загвар (GLM) суурилуулдаг. ГЛМ 2D байрлал кодлог нэмээд хоосон дүүрэлтэй хөгжлийг сайжруулж, NLU даалгавраас BERT болон T5-г нэмэгдүүлэх боломж олгодог. ГЛМ өөр төрлийн ажил дээр хоосон тоо болон урт нь өөрчлөгдөж болно. NLU, шалтгаан болон шаардлагагүй үеийн олон олон ажил дээр GLM нь BERT, T5, GPT-г ижил загварын хэмжээст, өгөгдлийн санааг өгсөн бөгөөд 1.25* BERT Large-ын параметртэй хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, өөр өөр доорх үйл ажиллагаанд ерөнхийлөгч чаддаг.', 'mt': 'Kien hemm diversi tipi ta’ arkitetturi ta’ taħriġ minn qabel inklużi mudelli ta’ awtokodifikazzjoni (e ż., BERT), mudelli awtokodifikanti (eż., GPT), u mudelli ta’ dekodifikazzjoni tal-kodiċi (eż., T5). Madankollu, l-ebda wieħed mill-oqfsa ta’ taħriġ minn qabel ma jwettaq l-aħjar għall-kompiti kollha ta’ tliet kategoriji ewlenin inkluż il-fehim tal-lingwa naturali (NLU), il-ġenerazzjoni mingħajr kundizzjonijiet, u l-ġenerazzjoni kundizzjonali. Aħna nipproponu Mudell Ġenerali tal-Lingwa (GLM) ibbażat fuq infillar vojt awtoregressiv biex nindirizzaw din l-isfida. GLM itejjeb il-pretaħriġ tal-mili vojt billi jżid l-ikkodifikazzjonijiet pożizzjonali 2D u jippermetti ordni arbitrarja biex jipprevedi firxiet, li jirriżulta f’kisbiet fil-prestazzjoni fuq BERT u T5 fuq kompiti NLU. Meanwhile, GLM can be pretrained for different types of tasks by varying the number and lengths of blanks.  Fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ kompiti madwar l-NLU, ġenerazzjoni kundizzjonali u mingħajr kundizzjoni, il-GLM jaqbeż il-BERT, it-T5, u l-GPT minħabba l-istess daqsijiet u dejta tal-mudell, u jikseb l-a ħjar prestazzjoni minn mudell wieħed imħarreġ minn qabel b’parametri ta’ 1.25* ta’ BERT Large, li juri l-ġeneralizzazzjoni tiegħu għal kompiti downstream differenti.', 'pl': 'Istnieją różne rodzaje architektur wstępnego treningu, w tym modele autokodowania (np. BERT), modele autoregresywne (np. GPT) oraz modele kodowania-dekodera (np. T5). Jednak żaden z ram wstępnego treningu nie spełnia najlepiej wszystkich zadań trzech głównych kategorii, w tym rozumienia języka naturalnego (NLU), bezwarunkowego generowania i generowania warunkowego. Proponujemy ogólny model językowy (GLM) oparty na autoregresywnym wypełnianiu pustym, aby sprostać temu wyzwaniu. GLM poprawia wstępne szkolenie wypełniania pustych, dodając kodowanie pozycjonalne 2D i umożliwiając dowolną kolejność przewidywania rozpięć, co powoduje wzrost wydajności w stosunku do BERT i T5 w zadaniach NLU. Tymczasem GLM może być wstępnie trenowany dla różnych rodzajów zadań, zmieniając liczbę i długość blanków. W szerokim zakresie zadań w NLU, generowaniu warunkowego i bezwarunkowego, GLM przewyższa BERT, T5 i GPT, biorąc pod uwagę te same rozmiary i dane modelu oraz osiąga najlepszą wydajność dzięki pojedynczemu wstępnie trenowanemu modelowi z parametrami 1.25* BERT Large, co pokazuje jego ogólność do różnych zadań niższego szczebla.', 'ro': 'Au existat diferite tipuri de arhitecturi de pre-formare, inclusiv modele de auto-codificare (de exemplu, BERT), modele auto-regresive (de exemplu, GPT) și modele encoder-decoder (de exemplu, T5). Cu toate acestea, niciunul dintre cadrele de pregătire nu este cel mai bun pentru toate sarcinile din trei categorii principale, inclusiv înțelegerea limbajului natural (NLU), generarea necondiționată și generarea condiționată. Propunem un model de limbă generală (GLM) bazat pe umplere albă autoregresivă pentru a aborda această provocare. GLM îmbunătățește pregătirea umplerii goale prin adăugarea codărilor 2D poziționale și permite o ordine arbitrară de a prezice intervalele, ceea ce duce la creșteri de performanță față de BERT și T5 în sarcinile NLU. Între timp, GLM poate fi pre-instruit pentru diferite tipuri de sarcini prin variarea numărului și lungimii de spații libere. Într-o gamă largă de sarcini din cadrul UNL, generarea condiționată și necondiționată, GLM depășește BERT, T5 și GPT având aceleași dimensiuni și date ale modelului și obține cele mai bune performanțe dintr-un singur model pre-instruit cu parametri de 1,25* ai BERT Large, demonstrând generalizarea sa la diferite sarcini din aval.', 'sr': 'Postoje različite vrste pretkišnih arhitektura uključujući modele autokodiranja (npr. BERT), autoregresivne modele (npr. GPT) i modele kodiranja (npr. T5). Međutim, nijedan od okvira pretkivanja ne izvršava najbolje za sve zadatke tri glavne kategorije uključujući prirodno razumijevanje jezika (NLU), bezuvjetnu generaciju i uvjetnu generaciju. Predlažemo generalni jezički model (GLM) na osnovu autoregresivnog praznog ulaska kako bi se riješili ovaj izazov. GLM poboljšava prazno ispunjavanje pretkivanja dodajući 2D pozicionalne kodiranje i omogućavajući proizvodnju naređenja da predvidi prostore, što rezultira dobijanja izvedbe preko BERT i T5 na zadatke NLU. U međuvremenu, GLM se može pretvoriti za različite vrste zadataka razlikovati broj i dužine praznih. Na širokom nizu zadataka širom NLU, uvjetnih i bezuvjetnih generacija, GLM je nadmašio BERT, T5 i GPT s obzirom na iste modele veličine i podatke, i ostvario najbolje izvedbe iz jednog model a sa 1,25* parametara BERT Velikog, pokazujući svoju generalizaciju na različite sledeće zadatake.', 'so': "Waxaa jirtay noocyo kala duduwan oo la soo daabacay dhismaha, kuwaas oo ku jira tusaale ahaan qoraalka koodeynta (tusaale ahaan BERT), modellada automaareeyaha (tusaale ahaan GPT) iyo modelalka koodeynta (tusaale ahaan T5). Si kastaba ha ahaatee, mid ka mid ah firaaqada hore shaqooyinka ugu wanaagsan ee saddex kooxood oo madax u ah, kuwaas oo ah garashada afka asalka ah (NLU), qarni aan shaqeyn iyo qarni sharaf leh. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa muusikada luqada guud (GLM) oo lagu saleynayo qof aan khatar lahayn oo kaliya ah si aan ula macaamiloono dhibaatadan. GLM wuxuu hagaajiyaa buuxinta booli ah oo uu ku qorayo qoraalka booska ah oo 2D ah, wuxuuna u ogolaan karaa amar la'aan oo uu ka hor dhigo jasiintiisa, taasoo sababto ah dhamaadka ka faa'iido ka badan BERT iyo T5 shaqooyinka NLU. Inta waqtiga lagu jiro waxaa loo soo bandhigi karaa GLM shaqooyin kala duduwan sida loo kala beddelo tirada iyo dhererka shaqo oo kaliya. Shaqooyin badan oo ka mid ah NLU, qarniga sharciga iyo shaqo la’aanta GLM wuxuu sameeyaa BERT, T5, iyo GPT waxay siiyeen isku mid qaab oo kale, wuxuuna gaadhaa sameynta ugu wanaagsan model 1.25* oo ah bareecada BERT Large, wuxuuna muujiyaa dhamaan shaqooyin kala duduwan oo hoose ka socda.", 'si': 'ස්වයංකේතිකරණය විශේෂ විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිරීම් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිරීම් විදිහට තියෙනවා (උදාහරණය, BERT), ස්වයංකේතිකරණය විදිහට (උදාහරණය, GPT), සහ නමුත්, ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරින්ස් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තුනක් ප්\u200dරමාණ භාෂාව තේරුම් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණ භාෂාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් හැම වැඩක්ම හොඳ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව මොඩේල් (GLM) කිරීමට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ කරනවා මේ අභාවිත විශ්වාස කරන්න. Name අන්තර්යයෙන්, GLM වෙනස් වර්ගයක් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්. NLU වලින් විශාල වැඩේ වැඩි වැඩේ වැඩියෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dයය සහ අසාමාන්\u200dයය ප්\u200dරමාණය, GLM වැඩිය BERT, T5, සහ GPT එකම මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ දත්ත සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා 1.25* BERT', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி குறியீட்டு மாதிரிகளைச் சேர்த்து மாதிரிகளைக் கொண்டு வெவ்வேறு வகையான உருவாக்கிகள் உள்ளன (உ. ம். BERT), தானியங்கி கட்டுப்பாட்டு மாதிரி ஆனால், மூன்று முக்கிய வகுப்புகளின் சிறந்த பணிகள் எதுவும் செய்ய முடியாது, இயற்கையான மொழி புரிவு (NLU), தொழில்லாத தலைமுறையில்,  நாம் இந்த சவாலிக்கை முடியும் பொது மொழி மாதிரி (GLM) அடிப்படையில் தானாகவே கட்டுப்படுத்தி வெற்று உள்ளீடு  Name இப்போது, GLM வெற்றுக்கான எண்ணையும் நீளத்தையும் வேறுபடுத்தி வேறு வகைகளுக்கு முன்னோட்டமைக்கப்பட முடியும். NLU முழுவதும் நிபந்தனையான பணிகளில், GLM BERT, T5, மற்றும் GPT கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி அளவுகள் மற்றும் தரவுகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது, மற்றும் BERT பெரிய அளபுருக்களில் 1. 25* இருந்து சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டை பெற', 'ur': 'اتوکوڈ ڈیکوڈ موڈل (جیسے BERT) کے شامل مختلف طریقوں کی پررینٹ ڈیکوڈر ڈیکوڈر (جیسے GPT) اور اکڈر ڈیکوڈر موڈل (جیسے T5) ہیں۔ However, none of the pretraining frameworks performs the best for all tasks of three main categories including natural language understanding (NLU), unconditional generation, and conditional generation. ہم ایک عمومی زبان موڈل (GLM) کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو اس چال کے بارے میں استعمال کرنے کے لئے autoregressive blank infilling پر بنیاد ہے. GLM نے 2D موقعیت اکڈینڈ جمع کر کھلی پر پرٹرینڈ بھرا ہوا مزید کرتا ہے اور اسپانیوں کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے ایک غیر قابل توفیق دیتا ہے، جس کے نتیجہ میں BERT اور T5 کے ذریعہ NLU کے کاموں پر فائدہ حاصل ہوتا ہے. Meanwhile, GLM can be pretrained for different types of tasks by changing the number and length of blanks. NLU کے درمیان ایک گھیرے کام پر، کنڈیسی اور بغیر شرط کی نسل، GLM BERT, T5 اور GPT کو ایک ہی موڈل کی اندازے اور ڈاٹ کے ذریعہ سے کام کرتا ہے، اور BERT بزرگ کے 1.25* پارامیٹوں سے بہترین کام حاصل کرتا ہے، اور اس کی عمومی کام کو دکھاتا ہے۔', 'sv': 'Det har funnits olika typer av förberedande arkitekturer, inklusive autokodningsmodeller (t.ex. BERT), autoregressiva modeller (t.ex. GPT) och encoder-dekoder modeller (t.ex. T5). Men ingen av de förberedande ramverken presterar bäst för alla uppgifter i tre huvudkategorier, inklusive naturlig språkförståelse (NLU), villkorslös generation och villkorlig generation. Vi föreslår en allmän språkmodell (GLM) baserad på autoregressiv blankfyllning för att hantera denna utmaning. GLM förbättrar fortbildningen av blankfyllning genom att lägga till 2D-positionskodningar och tillåta en godtycklig ordning för att förutsäga spännvidder, vilket resulterar i prestandaförbättringar jämfört med BERT och T5 på NLU-uppgifter. Samtidigt kan GLM förberedas för olika typer av uppgifter genom att variera antal och längder av tomma ämnen. GLM presterar bättre än BERT, T5 och GPT med samma modellstorlek och data på ett brett spektrum av uppgifter inom NLU, villkorad och villkorslös generering, och uppnår bästa prestanda från en enda förkränad modell med 1,25* parametrar för BERT Large, vilket visar att den är generaliserad till olika nedströmsuppgifter.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, o'ylab ko'rib chiqarishda hech kim uchta asosiy guruhlar uchun eng eng eng yaxshi vazifalarni bajaradi, tabiiy tilni tushunish (NLU), hech qanday avlod va holatda avlod avlod. Biz buni murakkab qilish uchun avto- regressiv boʻsh qoʻshish asosida yaratilgan umumiy til modeli (GLM). Name @ info: whatsthis @ info", 'vi': 'Có rất nhiều kiểu kiến trúc trước mưa bao g ồm các mô hình tự động (v. d. BERT), các mô hình tự vệ (v. d. GPT), và mô hình mã hóa (v.d. T5). Tuy nhiên, không có quy định nào hoàn thiện tốt nhất cho mọi nhiệm vụ của ba loại chính bao gồm ngôn ngữ thông thường (Nluu), thế hệ vô điều kiện và thế hệ phụ thuộc. Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình ngôn ngữ chung (GLM) dựa trên tín hiệu tự vệ trống để giải quyết thử thách này. Kỹ năng lượng GLM cải thiện lượng trước lớp khai vị bằng cách thêm các mã số vị 2D và cho phép phép một mệnh lệnh ngẫu nhiên dự đoán chi tiết, dẫn đến hiệu suất tăng lợi trên tập đoàn BERT và T5 về các công việc Ntrường. Trong khi đó, GLM có thể được premưa cho các loại công việc khác nhau bằng cách thay đổi số lượng và độ dài của khoảng trống. Trong một loạt các công việc khác nhau trong lãnh vực Ntrường, thế hệ phụ thuộc và không điều kiện, GLM thực hiện giao kèo BERT, T5, và GPT với cùng cỡ và dữ liệu mẫu, và đạt được hiệu quả tốt nhất từ một mô hình premưa duy nhất có các thông số của BERT Large, chứng minh khả năng phát triển của nó với các công việc xuôi dòng khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Има различни видове архитектури за предтрениране, включително модели за автоматично кодиране (например BERT), авторегресивни модели (например GPT) и модели за кодиране-декодер (напр. T5). Въпреки това, никоя от предтренировъчните рамки не изпълнява най-добре всички задачи от три основни категории, включително разбиране на естествения език (НЛУ), безусловно генериране и условно генериране. Предлагаме общ езиков модел (ГЛМ), базиран на авторегресивно пълнене на празни файлове, за да се справим с това предизвикателство. Подобрява предтренирането на празно запълване чрез добавяне на 2позиционни кодировки и позволяване на произволен ред за прогнозиране на интервали, което води до повишаване на производителността над BERT и T5 при задачите на НЛУ. Междувременно, може да бъде предварително трениран за различни видове задачи чрез промяна на броя и дължините на заготовките. При широк спектър от задачи в НЛУ, условно и безусловно генериране, GLM превъзхожда BERT, T5 и GPT при същите размери и данни на модела и постига най-добра производителност от един предварително трениран модел с 1,25* параметри на BERT Large, демонстрирайки неговата обобщаваемост към различни задачи надолу по веригата.', 'nl': "Er zijn verschillende soorten pretraining architecturen geweest, waaronder autocoderingsmodellen (bijv. BERT), autoregressieve modellen (bijv. GPT) en encoder-decoder modellen (bijv. T5). Echter, geen van de pretraining frameworks presteert het beste voor alle taken van drie hoofdcategorieën, waaronder natuurlijk taalbegrip (NLU), onvoorwaardelijke generatie en voorwaardelijke generatie. We stellen een General Language Model (GLM) voor op basis van autoregressieve blanco vulling om deze uitdaging aan te pakken. GLM verbetert de pretraining van blanco vulling door 2D-positiecoderingen toe te voegen en een willekeurige volgorde toe te staan om overspanningen te voorspellen, wat resulteert in prestatiewinst ten opzichte van BERT en T5 bij NLU-taken. Ondertussen kan GLM worden voorgetraind voor verschillende soorten taken door het aantal en de lengtes van blanco's te variëren. Voor een breed scala aan taken binnen NLU, voorwaardelijke en onvoorwaardelijke generatie, presteert GLM beter dan BERT, T5 en GPT met dezelfde modelgrootte en gegevens, en bereikt de beste prestaties vanuit een enkel vooraf getraind model met 1.25*-parameters van BERT Large, wat aantoont dat het veralgemeenschappelijk is voor verschillende downstreamtaken.", 'hr': 'Postoje različite vrste arhitekture pretkivanja uključujući modele autokodiranja (npr. BERT), autoregresivne modele (npr. GPT) i modele kodiranja dekodera (npr. T5). Međutim, nijedan od okvira pretkivanja ne čini najbolje za sve zadatke tri glavne kategorije uključujući prirodno razumijevanje jezika (NLU), bezuvjetnu generaciju i uvjetnu generaciju. Predlažemo općem jezičkom modelu (GLM) na temelju autoregresivnog praznog ulaska u rješavanje ovog izazova. GLM poboljšava prazno ispunjavanje pretkijanja dodajući 2D pozicionalne kodiranje i omogućavajući arbitrarnu naredbu za predviđanje prostora, što rezultira dobivanju učinka preko BERT i T5 na zadatke NLU-a. U međuvremenu, GLM se može pretvoriti za različite vrste zadataka različitim brojem i dužinom praznih mjesta. Na širokom rasponu zadataka širom NLU-a, uvjetnim i bezuvjetnim generacijama, GLM iznosi BERT, T5 i GPT s obzirom na istu modelu veličine i podatke i postiže najbolje učinkovito iz jednog modela s 1,25* parametara BERT Velikog, pokazujući svoju generalizaciju na različite zadatake u sklopu.', 'de': 'Es gab verschiedene Arten von Pretraining-Architekturen, darunter Autokodierungsmodelle (z. B. BERT), Autoregressive Modelle (z. B. GPT) und Encoder-Decoder-Modelle (z. B. T5). Keines der Vortrainings-Frameworks erfüllt jedoch die besten Aufgaben in drei Hauptkategorien, einschließlich des Verständnisses natürlicher Sprache (NLU), der bedingungslosen Generierung und der bedingten Generierung. Wir schlagen ein General Language Model (GLM) vor, das auf autoregressiver Leerfüllung basiert. GLM verbessert das Vortraining der Leerfüllung durch Hinzufügen von 2D-Positionscodierungen und erlaubt eine beliebige Reihenfolge, Spannweiten vorherzusagen, was zu Leistungssteigerungen gegenüber BERT und T5 bei NLU-Aufgaben führt. Inzwischen kann GLM für verschiedene Aufgabentypen vorgetrainiert werden, indem die Anzahl und Längen der Rohlinge variiert werden. Bei einer Vielzahl von Aufgaben über NLU, bedingte und bedingungslose Generierung übertrifft GLM BERT, T5 und GPT bei gleichen Modellgrößen und Daten und erzielt die beste Leistung aus einem einzigen vortrainierten Modell mit 1,25*-Parametern von BERT Large, was seine Verallgemeinerbarkeit für verschiedene nachgelagerte Aufgaben demonstriert.', 'id': 'Terdapat berbagai jenis arsitektur pretraining termasuk model auto-encoding (contohnya BERT), model autoregressif (contohnya GPT), dan model encoder-decoder (contohnya T5). Bagaimanapun, tidak satu pun dari bingkai pretraining melakukan yang terbaik untuk semua tugas dari tiga kategori utama termasuk pemahaman bahasa alam (NLU), generasi tanpa syarat, dan generasi syarat. Kami mengusulkan Model Bahasa Umum (GLM) berdasarkan infiling kosong autoregresif untuk mengatasi tantangan ini. GLM meningkatkan penuhian kosong pretraining dengan menambahkan pengekodan posisi 2D dan memungkinkan perintah secara arbitrar untuk memprediksi jangkauan, yang mengakibatkan keuntungan prestasi lebih dari BERT dan T5 pada tugas NLU. Sementara itu, GLM dapat dilatih untuk tipe-tipe tugas berbeda dengan mengubah bilangan dan panjang kosong. Pada jangkauan lebar tugas di seluruh NLU, kondisional dan tidak kondisional generasi, GLM melampaui BERT, T5, dan GPT memberikan ukuran model dan data yang sama, dan mencapai prestasi terbaik dari model tunggal yang dilatih sebelum dilatih dengan 1,25* parameter BERT Large , menunjukkan generalisasinya ke tugas turun yang berbeda.', 'da': 'Der har været forskellige typer af forudgående arkitekturer, herunder autokodningsmodeller (f.eks. BERT), autoregressive modeller (f.eks. GPT) og encoder-dekoder modeller (f.eks. T5). Men ingen af de forudgående rammer fungerer bedst til alle opgaver i tre hovedkategorier, herunder naturlig sprogforståelse (NLU), betingelsesløs generering og betinget generering. Vi foreslår en generel sprogmodel (GLM) baseret på autoregressiv blank fyldning for at løse denne udfordring. GLM forbedrer fortræning af blankfyldning ved at tilføje 2D positionskodninger og tillade en vilkårlig rækkefølge til at forudsige spænder, hvilket resulterer i ydeevne gevinster i forhold til BERT og T5 på NLU-opgaver. I mellemtiden kan GLM forudtrænes til forskellige typer opgaver ved at variere antallet og længden af emner. På en lang række opgaver på tværs af NLU, betinget og ubetinget generering, overgår GLM BERT, T5 og GPT med de samme modelstørrelser og data og opnår den bedste ydeevne fra en enkelt prætrænet model med 1,25* parametre for BERT Large, hvilket viser, at den er generaliseret til forskellige downstream-opgaver.', 'ko': '자동 인코딩 모델(예를 들어 BERT), 자동 회귀 모델(예를 들어 GPT)과 디코더 모델(예를 들어 T5)을 포함한 다양한 유형의 예비 훈련 구조가 있다.그러나 자연 언어 이해(NLU), 무조건 생성과 조건 생성 세 가지 주요 유형의 모든 임무에서 가장 좋은 훈련 프레임워크가 없다.우리는 이 도전에 대응하기 위해 회귀 공백을 기반으로 하는 유니버설 언어 모델 (GLM) 을 제시했다.GLM은 2D 위치 인코딩을 추가하고 임의의 순서로 간격을 예측할 수 있도록 함으로써 공백 충전 훈련을 개선하여 NLU 작업에서 BERT와 T5보다 높은 성능을 얻을 수 있다.또한 공백의 수량과 길이를 바꾸어 GLM은 서로 다른 유형의 임무에 대해 예훈련을 할 수 있다.NLU 범위의 광범위한 임무(조건과 무조건 생성)에서 GLM은 같은 모델의 크기와 데이터 상황에서 BERT, T5와 GPT보다 우수하고 BERT의 큰 파라미터가 1.25*인 단일 예비훈련 모델에서 최상의 성능을 실현하여 서로 다른 하위 임무로 확대할 수 있음을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'نوع معماری\u200cهای پیش\u200cگیری\u200cکننده\u200cای از طریق\u200cها وجود دارد که شامل مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی خودکار (مثال BERT), مدل\u200cهای autoregressive (مثال GPT) و مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی\u200cکننده (مثال T5). ولی هیچ کدام از فرم\u200cهای پیش\u200cفرینش\u200cکننده\u200cای بهترین کارهای سه گروه اصلی را انجام نمی\u200cدهد که شامل درک زبان طبیعی (NLU), نسل\u200cهای بی\u200cشرط و نسل\u200cهای شرایط است. ما یک مدل زبان ژنرال (GLM) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس درآمد خالی خودگریسی برای حل این چالش کند. GLM با اضافه کردن رمزبندی موقعیت ۲D و اجازه دادن یک سفارش منصفانه برای پیش\u200cبینی فضا را بهتر می\u200cکند، که به نتیجه\u200cی اجرای برخورداری بیش از BERT و T5 روی کار NLU می\u200cرسد. در ضمن، GLM می\u200cتواند برای نوع کارهای مختلف با تغییر تعداد و طول خالی تغییر دهد. در یک مجموعه عملیات زیادی در کشور NLU، نسل شرایط و بدون شرایط، GLM BERT, T5 و GPT را به اندازه و داده های همان مدل انجام می دهد، و بهترین عملیات را از یک مدل با 1.25* پارامتر BERT بزرگ می رساند، نشان می دهد که توانایی عمومی را به کار های پایین\u200cترین پایین\u200cترین متفاوت نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Kulikuwa na aina mbalimbali ya majengo ya kujificha ikiwa ni pamoja na mifano ya kujikodi (kama vile BERT), mifano ya kujitawala (kwa mfano, GPT), na mifano ya kodi (kwa mfano, T5). Hata hivyo, hakuna moja ya mifumo ya kutengeneza matumizi yanafanya kazi bora zaidi kwa makundi matatu makuu ikiwa ni pamoja na kuelewa lugha ya asili (NLU), kizazi kisichoeleweka, na kizazi cha mazingira. Tunawapendekeza Modeli ya Lugha ya Kiujumla (GLM) kwa kutumia utawala wa kujidhibiti wa bure ili kupambana na changamoto hili. GLM inaboresha ujazo wa bure kwa kuongeza huduma mbili zilizo chanya na kuruhusu amri ya utekelezaji wa utaratibu, ambayo yanasababisha ufanisi unapata zaidi ya BERT na T5 kwenye kazi za NLU. Wakati huo huo, GLM inaweza kuchangazwa kwa aina mbalimbali za kazi kwa kubadilisha idadi na lengo la bure. Katika kazi mbalimbali za NLU, kizazi cha mazingira na kizazi kisichoeleweka, GLM kinafanya kazi ya BERT, T5, na GPT kwa kiwango hicho cha mifano na data, na kinapata ufanisi bora zaidi kutoka kwa model moja yenye kipimo cha BERT kikubwa cha 1.25* kinachoonyesha umuhimu wake kwa kazi mbalimbali za mitandao ya chini.', 'tr': 'Otomatik ködleme nusgalary (meselâ, BERT), awtomatik regressiv nusgalary (meselâ, GPT), we koder-dekoder nusgalary (meselâ, T5). Ýöne, öňünden geçirmek çapdaky çapdaky çapdaky çapdaky üç esasy kategoriýasynyň hemme zadyny iň gowy etmeýär. Täbiýal dil düşünmesi (NLU), şartsyz döwletleri we şartsyz döwletleri. Biz bu kynçylyky çözmek üçin umumy dil nusgasyna (GLM) tabanly GLM 2D pozisyonal ködlemeleri ekleyerek boş doldurum süslemesini geliştirir we gaplary tahmin etmek üçin bir şekilde mümkin edir. Bu da BERT we T5 üstünde NLU görevlerinde başarılar gazanýar. Bu arada, GLM farklı tür işler için boş sayıları ve uzunluğunu değiştirerek çarpılabilir. NLU, mümkin we şartsyz döwletlerde, GLM birnäçe nusgadan BERT, T5 we GPT şol nusgadan ölçü we maglumaty berilýär we 1.25* BERT Ullakan bir nusgadan iň gowy täsir edip bilýär , döwletlere düzümlenmiş işlerini belli edip bilýär.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեին տարբեր տեսակի նախավարժական ճարտարապետություններ, ներառյալ ինքնակոդավորման մոդելներ (օրինակ BER), ինքնագրավիչ մոդելներ (օրինակ GPT) և կոդավորման-կոդավորման մոդելներ (օրինակ T5). Այնուամենայնիվ, նախապատրաստման շրջաններից ոչ մեկը չի կատարում լավագույնը երեք հիմնական կատեգորիաների բոլոր խնդիրների համար, ներառյալ բնական լեզվի հասկացությունը (ՆԼՈ), անպայմանավոր սերունդը և պայմանավոր սերունդը We propose a General Language Model (GLM) based on autoregressive blank infilling to address this challenge.  GLM improves blank filling pretraining by adding 2D positional encodings and allowing an arbitrary order to predict spans, which results in performance gains over BERT and T5 on NLU tasks.  Միևնույն ժամանակ, GLM-ը կարող է նախապատրաստվել տարբեր խնդիրների համար՝ տարբերելով դատարկ մարդկանց թիվը և երկարությունը: ՆԼՄ-ի բազմաթիվ առաջադրանքներում, պայմանավոր և անպայմանավոր սերունդներում, GLM-ն արտադրում է BER, T5 և GPT-ը, հաշվի առնելով նույն մոդելի չափերը և տվյալները, և հասնում է լավագույն արդյունքներին մեկ նախավարժված մոդելի միջոցով, որը ունի BER Large-ի 1.25 * պարամետրեր, ցույց տալով իր ընդհան', 'af': "Daar is verskillende tipes van pretreĂ«ningsarkitektuure, insluitend autokodering modele (bv., BERT), autoregressiewe modele (bv., GPT), en enkoder-dekoder modele (bv., T5). Maar geen van die voortreĂ«nde raamwerke doen die beste vir alle werke van drie hoofkategorie insluitend natuurlike taal verstanding (NLU), onbepaalde generasie en voorwaardige generasie. Ons voorstel 'n Algemene Taal Model (GLM) gebaseer op outomatiese regressief leĂ« infiling om hierdie uitdrukking te adres. GLM verbeter leĂ« vervulling deur 2D posisionele kodering te voeg en toelaat 'n willekeurige volgorde om spans te voorskou, wat resultaat in prestasie verkry oor BERT en T5 op NLU opdragte. Gemiddeltyd, GLM kan vir verskillende tipes van taak vertrek word deur die nommer en lengte van leĂ« te verander. Op 'n wyde omvang van opdragte oor NLU, voorwaardes en onbepaalde generasie, GLM uitvoer BERT, T5 en GPT wat die selfde model grootte en data gegee het, en bereik die beste prestasie van 'n enkele pretreĂ«nde model met 1.25* parameters van BERT Groot, wat sy generelliserbaardigheid tot verskillende onderstreem opdragte bevestig.", 'am': 'የመዝገብ ቤት አካባቢዎች፣ የኮድ ኮድ ሞዴላዎች (ምሳሌ BERT)፣ autoregressive ሞዴላዎች (ምሳሌ GPT) እና የencoder-decoder models (e.g. T5). ምንም እንኳን፣ የዘለፋዊ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል (NLU)፣ የማይከላከል ትውልድ እና ክፍለ ትውልድ ውስጥ ያሉ ሦስት የዋነቶች ክፍሎች ሁሉ የሚሻለውን ሥራ አያደርግም፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል (GLM) ለዚህ ችግሩን ለማቀናቀል በራሱ ምሽልማት የተደረገ ባዶ መግለጫ እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ የGLM ስራ በBERT እና T5 በሚደረገው ስራ ላይ አግኝቷል፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም የGLM ቁጥር እና ርዝመት በተለየ የደረቅ ቁጥር በመለወጥ ለልዩ ዓይነቶች የሚደረጉትን ስርዓቶች ይታወቃል፡፡ በNLU፣ በአካባቢ እና ያለ ልዩ ትውልድ GLM BERT፣ T5 እና GPT በተለየ ዓይነት መጠን እና ዳታዎችን ይሰጣል፤ ከ1.25* በታላቅ BERT ትልቅ ምርጫዎች ጋር የተመሳሳይ ምርጫዎችን የሚያደርጋል፡፡', 'sq': 'Ka patur lloje të ndryshme arkitekturash parastërvitëse duke përfshirë modele autokodimi (për shembull BERT), modele autoregresive (për shembull GPT) dhe modele kodues-dekoder (për shembull T5). Megjithatë, asnjë nga kuadrit e parastërvitjes nuk kryen më të mirën për të gjitha detyrat e tre kategorive kryesore duke përfshirë kuptimin natyror të gjuhës (NLU), gjeneratën pa kushte dhe gjeneratën e kushtueshme. Ne propozojmë një Model Gjuhash të Përgjithshëm (GLM) bazuar në përdorimin bosh autoregresiv për të trajtuar këtë sfidë. GLM përmirëson mbushjen e zbrazët të parastërvitjes duke shtuar kodifikime pozitive 2D dhe duke lejuar një rend arbitrar për të parashikuar intervalet, që rezulton në fitime performance mbi BERT dhe T5 në detyrat NLU. Ndërkohë, GLM mund të trajnohet për lloje të ndryshme detyrash duke ndryshuar numrin dhe gjatësinë e bosh. Në një gamë të gjerë detyrash anembanë NLU, gjeneratës kushtuese dhe pa kushte, GLM kryen BERT, T5 dhe GPT duke dhënë të njëjtat madhësi modeli dhe të dhëna dhe arrin performancën më të mirë nga një model i vetëm i stërvitur përpara me 1.25* parametra të BERT Large, duke demonstruar gjeneralizueshmërinë e tij ndaj detyrave të ndryshme poshtë.', 'az': 'Autokodlama modelləri (bəzisi, BERT), autoregressiv modelləri (bəzisi, GPT) və kodlama modelləri (bəzisi, T5) dahil olmaqla müxtəlif pretraining arhitektarları var. Lakin, təbiətli dil anlaşılması (NLU), şartsız nəsil və şartsız nəsil içərisində üç ana kategoriyanın bütün işlərinin ən yaxşısını yerinə yetirməz. Biz bu çətinlikdən çəkinmək üçün autoregressiv boş infillərə dayanan General Dil Modeli (GLM) təklif edirik. GLM 2D pozisyonal kodlamaları eklərək boş doldurulmasını yaxşılaşdırır və NLU işləri üzərində BERT və T5 üstündə müəyyən edilən müəyyən müddəti təmin edir. Bu arada, GLM müxtəlif işlərin sayını və uzunluğunu dəyişdirərək fərqli cür işlər üçün təmizlənir. NLU arasında, müxtəlif və çətinliksiz nəsillərdə, GLM BERT, T5 və GPT eyni modellərin böyüklüyü və məlumatlarını verir və BERT Büyüklüyünün 1.25* parametrinin ən yaxşı performansını başa çatdırar və bu modellərin genelləşdirilməsini müxtəlif indirilmiş işlərə göstərər.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় কোডিং মডেল (উদাহরণস্বরূপ BERT), স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণ মডেল (উদাহরণস্বরূপ জিপিটি), এবং এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল (উদাহরণস্বরূপ T5). তবে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝতে পারে (এনএলইউ), অস্থায়ী প্রজন্ম এবং অস্থায়ী প্রজন্ম। We propose a General Language Model (GLM) based on autoregressive blank infilling to address this challenge.  দ্বিতীয় ইতিবাচক এনকোডিং যোগ করার মাধ্যমে জিএলএম ফাঁকা বৃষ্টির পূর্ণ ভাষায় পরিবর্তন করেছে এবং স্প্যানের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার অনুমতি দিয়েছে, যার ফলে এনএলই এদিকে জিএলএম বিভিন্ন ধরনের কাজের জন্য অনুভূতি প্রদর্শন করা যাবে ফাঁকা সংখ্যা ও দীর্ঘদিনের মাধ্যমে। এনএলইউ সারা বিশাল বিভিন্ন কাজের মধ্যে জিএলএম বিবের্ট, টি৫ এবং জিপিটি একই মডেলের আকার ও তথ্য প্রদর্শন করেছে এবং বিআরটি ব্যাপারের ১. ২৫* প্যারামিটার থেকে সর্বশ্রেষ্ঠ প্রদর্শন করেছে।', 'et': "On olnud mitmesuguseid tüüpe eeltreeningu arhitektuure, sealhulgas automaatkodeerimise mudeleid (nt BERT), autoregressiivseid mudeleid (nt GPT) ja kodeerija-dekooderi mudeleid (nt T5). Ükski väljaõppeeelne raamistik ei täida kõige paremini kolme põhikategooria ülesandeid, sealhulgas looduskeele mõistmine, tingimusteta genereerimine ja tingimustega genereerimine. Selle väljakutse lahendamiseks pakume välja üldise keelemudeli (GLM), mis põhineb autoregressiivsel tühjadel täitmisel. GLM parandab tühja täitmise eeltreeningut, lisades 2D positsioonikodeeringuid ja võimaldades suvalisel järjekorral ennustada vahemikke, mis toob kaasa jõudluse suurenemise BERT ja T5-ga võrreldes NLU ülesannetega. Samal ajal saab GLM-i eeltreenida erinevat tüüpi ülesannete jaoks, muutes tühikute arvu ja pikkust. NLU, tingimusliku ja tingimusteta tootmise erinevates ülesannetes ületab GLM BERT, T5 ja GPT samade mudelite suuruste ja andmete puhul ning saavutab parima tulemuse ühest eeltreenitud mudelist, millel on BERT Large'i 1,25* parameetrid, mis näitavad selle üldistatavust erinevatele järgnevatele ülesannetele.", 'ca': "Hi ha hagut diversos tipus d'arquitectures de pré-formació, incloent models d'autocodificació (per exemple BERT), models autoregressius (per exemple GPT) i models de codificació-decodificació (per exemple T5). No obstant això, cap dels marcs de pré-formació fa el millor per a totes les tasques de tres categories principals, incloent la comprensió natural del llenguatge (NLU), la generació incondicional i la generació condicional. Proposem un model de llenguatge general (GLM) basat en una infilació en blanc autoregressiva per abordar aquest repte. GLM millora la pré-capacitació en blanc afegint codificacions posicionals en 2D i permet una orden arbitrària de predir intervals, que resulta en guanys de rendiment sobre BERT i T5 en tasques NLU. Mentrestant, el GLM pot ser pré-entrenat per diferents tipus de tasques variant el nombre i la llargada de blancs. En una amplia gama de tasques a través de la NLU, generació condicional i incondicional, GLM supera BERT, T5 i GPT, donant les mateixes dimensions i dades del model, i aconsegueix el millor rendiment d'un únic model pré-entrenat amb 1,25* paràmetres de BERT Large, demostrant la seva generalització a diferents tasques avall.", 'bs': 'Postoje različite vrste pretkišnih arhitektura uključujući modele autokodiranja (npr. BERT), autoregresivne modele (npr. GPT) i modele kodiranja (npr. T5). Međutim, nijedan od okvira pretkivanja ne čini najbolje za sve zadatke tri glavne kategorije uključujući prirodno razumijevanje jezika (NLU), bezuvjetnu generaciju i uvjetnu generaciju. Predlažemo općem jezičkom modelu (GLM) na temelju autoregresivnog praznog ulaska u rješavanje ovog izazova. GLM poboljšava prazno ispunjavanje pretkijanja dodajući 2D pozicionalne kodiranje i omogućavajući arbitrarnu naredbu za predviđanje prostora, što rezultira uspješnosti dobijanja preko BERT i T5 na zadatke NLU. U međuvremenu, GLM se može pretvoriti za različite vrste zadataka različitim brojem i dužinom praznih mjesta. Na širokom nizu zadataka širom NLU-a, uvjetne i bezuvjetne generacije, GLM je nadmašila BERT, T5 i GPT s obzirom na iste modele veličine i podatke i ostvarila najbolje učinkovito iz jednog modela sa 1,25* parametara BERT Velikog, pokazujući svoju generalizaciju na različite zadatake.', 'fi': 'Esiharjoitusarkkitehtuuria on ollut monenlaisia, mukaan lukien automaattikoodausmallit (esim. BERT), autoregressiiviset mallit (esim. GPT) ja kooderi-dekooderimallit (esim. T5). Yksikään esikoulutuskehyksistä ei kuitenkaan suoriudu parhaiten kaikkien kolmen pääluokan tehtävien suorittamiseen, mukaan lukien luonnollisen kielen ymmärtäminen (NLU), ehdoton sukupolvi ja ehdollinen sukupolvi. Tämän haasteen ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme yleistä kielimallia (GLM), joka perustuu autoregressiiviseen tyhjätäyttöön. GLM parantaa tyhjien täyttöjen esikoulutusta lisäämällä 2D-paikkakoodauksia ja sallimalla mielivaltaisen järjestyksen ennustaa välejä, mikä johtaa suorituskykyyn verrattuna BERT- ja T5-tehtäviin NLU-tehtävissä. Samaan aikaan GLM voidaan esikouluttaa erilaisiin tehtäviin muuttamalla tyhjiöiden määrää ja pituutta. GLM suoriutuu BERT:stä, T5:stä ja GPT:stä, kun otetaan huomioon samat mallit ja tiedot, ja saavuttaa parhaan suorituskyvyn yhdestä esikoulutetusta mallista, jossa on 1,25* parametrit BERT Largesta, mikä osoittaa sen yleistettävyyden eri jatkojalostustehtäviin.', 'cs': 'Existují různé typy architektur předškolení, včetně modelů autokódování (např. BERT), autoregresivních modelů (např. GPT) a kodérových modelů (např. T5). Nicméně žádný z předtréninkových rámců není nejlepší pro všechny úkoly tří hlavních kategorií, včetně porozumění přirozenému jazyku (NLU), bezpodmínečné generování a podmíněné generování. Pro řešení této výzvy navrhujeme General Language Model (GLM) založený na autoregresivním prázdném výplně. GLM zlepšuje předtrénování prázdného plnění přidáním 2D polohového kódování a umožňuje libovolné pořadí předpovídat rozpětí, což má za následek zvýšení výkonu oproti BERT a T5 u úloh NLU. Mezitím lze GLM předem trénovat pro různé typy úkolů změnou počtu a délky polotovarů. Při široké škále úkolů napříč NLU, podmíněným a bezpodmínečným generováním, GLM překonává BERT, T5 a GPT při stejných velikostech a datech modelu a dosahuje nejlepšího výkonu z jediného předtrénovaného modelu s 1,25* parametry BERT Large, což prokazuje jeho obecnětelnost pro různé následné úkoly.', 'he': "היו סוגים שונים של ארכיטקטורות מקדמות, כולל דוגמנים של קידוד אוטומטי (למשל BERT), דוגמנים אוטו-מגרסים (למשל GPT), ודוגמנים של קידוד-מגרסים (למשל T5). בכל אופן, אף אחד מהמסגרות המיומנות לא מבצעים את הטוב ביותר לכל המשימות של שלושה קאטגוריות ראשונות כולל הבנה טבעית בשפה (NLU), דור ללא תנאים, ודור תנאי. אנו מציעים מודל שפה כללי (GLM) מבוסס על ניתוח ריק אוטו-מגרסיבי כדי להתמודד עם האתגר הזה. GLM משפר מילוי מראש ריק על ידי הוספת קודים עמדות 2D ואפשר צו רציני לחזות אורך, מה שמביא לזכויות ביצועים מעל BERT וטי-5 על משימות NLU. בינתיים, GLM ניתן להתאמן לפני סוגים שונים של משימות על ידי שינוי במספר ואורכים של ריקים. על מגוון רחב של משימות ברחבי NLU, דור מונחי וחסר תנאי, GLM מוביל את BERT, T5, וג'י.פי.טי, בהתחשב באותו גודל ומידע מודל, ומשגש את ההופעה הטובה ביותר ממודל אחד מתאמן מראש עם 1.25* פארמטרים של BERT Large, שמוכיחים את הגנרליזציה שלה למשימות מתחתונות שונות.", 'ha': "An sami nau'i-nau'i masu ƙayyade matsayin baka-baka (misali, BERT), misãlai na farat-regressive (misali, GPT), da misãlai-koda-koda (misali, T5). A lokacin da, bãbu wani daga firamman da ke aikata mafi kyaun aikin dukkan categories uku, kamar fahimta lugha na natura (NLU), kizazi da ba'a taƙaita ba, da kizazi na sharci. Munã buɗar da wata Model na Lugha na General (GLM) kan karatun nau'in da za'a yi amfani da wannan bango. @ label A lokacin da ake iya ƙayyade GLM wa nau'i-nau'i masu daban-daban aikin su daban-daban launin da Long-Long of an Empty. On a wide range of tasks across NLU, conditional and unconditional generation, GLM outperforms BERT, T5, and GPT given the same model sizes and data, and achieves the best performance from a single pretrained model with 1.25* parameters of BERT Large , demonstrating its generalizability to different downstream tasks.", 'bo': 'There have been various types of pretraining architectures including autoencoding models (e.g., BERT), autoregressive models (e.g., GPT), and encoder-decoder models (e.g., T5). ཡིན་ནའང་། pretraining frameworks (NLU)་ནང་དུ་མི་མཐུན་པས། རྩ་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་བྱ་སྟངས་གང་ཡང་བྱེད་པ་མིན་ན། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་མ་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་གནང་བ་རེད། GLM ཡིས་2D གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌི་ཁ་སྐོང་བར་བཅད་པ་སྟོང་བ་ཡིན་པའི་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་། ད་ནའང་། GLM ནི་གནད་གཤིས་ཀྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་དང་སྟོང་བ་ཡི་རིང་ཚད་མི་འདྲ་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་སྔར་སྒྲིག On a wide range of tasks across NLU, conditional and unconditional generation, GLM outperforms BERT, T5, and GPT given the same model sizes and data, and achieves the best performance from a single pretrained model with 1.25* parameters of BERT Large, demonstrating its generalizability to different downstream tasks.', 'jv': 'Ana sing klopot karo akeh sistem sing paling nggawe model autokoding (isih, BERT), autoRegresve model (isih, Gpta), lan koder-decoder model (isih, T 5). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerasakno model General Language (GLM) sing basa autoRegrés boton kanggo nganggo perbudhakan iki. GLM first politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Punika andhadi akeh operasi sing paling nggambar NLU, kondisione lan akeh gak nggawe, GLM iso nggawe BERT, T 5, lan GT kuwi nggawe model sing berarti dipunangé sampeyan lan data, lan kang sampeyan akeh lanjut sampeyan sing wis dipunangé paramé sing 1.5*dadi BERT Wide , dadi nggawe barang nggawe operasi wis dumateng', 'sk': 'Obstajajo različne vrste arhitektur predtreninga, vključno z modeli samokodiranja (npr. BERT), avtoregresivnimi modeli (npr. GPT) in modeli kodiranja-dekodiranja (npr. T5). Vendar pa noben od okvirov predusposabljanja ne izvaja najboljšega za vse naloge treh glavnih kategorij, vključno z razumevanjem naravnega jezika (NLU), brezpogojno generacijo in pogojno generacijo. Za reševanje tega izziva predlagamo splošni jezikovni model (GLM), ki temelji na avtoregresivnem polnjenju praznih praznin. GLM izboljša predurjenje praznega polnjenja z dodajanjem 2D pozicijskih kodiranj in omogočanjem poljubnega vrstnega reda za napoved razponov, kar povzroči večjo zmogljivost v primerjavi z BERT in T5 pri nalogah NLU. Medtem lahko GLM predvadimo za različne vrste opravil tako, da spreminjamo število in dolžino praznih oken. GLM pri širokem naboru nalog v NLU, pogojni in brezpogojni proizvodnji presega BERT, T5 in GPT z enakimi velikostmi modelov in podatki ter doseže najboljšo zmogljivost enega samega predvadljenega modela z 1,25* parametri BERT Large, kar dokazuje njegovo splošljivost za različne naloge nadaljnje proizvodnje.'}
{'en': 'bert2', 'ar': 'QuoteR: معيار توصية الاقتباس للكتابة', 'fr': 'QuoTer\xa0: une référence de recommandation de devis pour la rédaction', 'es': 'QuoTer: Un punto de referencia de recomendación de cotización para escribir', 'pt': 'QuoteR: uma referência de recomendação de cotação para redação', 'ja': 'QuoteR ：書き込みのための見積推奨のベンチマーク', 'zh': '报价曰:报价所荐也', 'ru': 'QuoteR: Эталон цитаты Рекомендация для написания', 'hi': 'QuoteR: लेखन के लिए उद्धरण सिफारिश का एक बेंचमार्क', 'ga': 'QuoteR: Tagarmharc Molta Athfhriotail don Scríobh', 'ka': 'QPrintPreviewDialog', 'hu': 'QuoteR: Az idézet referenciaértéke az íráshoz', 'el': 'Ένα κριτήριο αναφοράς της σύστασης προσφοράς για τη συγγραφή', 'it': 'QuoteR: Un benchmark di raccomandazione di citazione per la scrittura', 'kk': 'ReplyForward', 'lt': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'mk': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'ms': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'ml': 'കോട്ടോറ്റര്\u200d: എഴുതുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക്', 'mt': 'QuoteR: Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'mn': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'ro': 'QuoteR: Un criteriu de referință pentru recomandarea citatului pentru scriere', 'no': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'sr': 'ReplyForward', 'pl': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'so': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'si': 'QOCIResult', 'sv': 'QuoteR: Ett riktmärke för citat rekommendation för skrivning', 'ta': 'மேற்கோள்: எழுதுவதற்கான ஒரு மேற்கோள் பரிந்துரை', 'ur': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'uz': 'Quote: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'vi': 'Trích dẫn: A tiêu chuẩn của lời thỉnh giáo', 'bg': 'Референтен показател за препоръка за цитати за писане', 'da': 'QuoteR: Et benchmark for citat Anbefaling til skrivning', 'nl': 'QuoteR: Een benchmark van citaataanbeveling voor schrijven', 'hr': 'ReplyForward', 'de': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'id': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'fa': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'ko': '견적자: 견적 추천의 기준을 작성한다', 'sw': 'Nukuu R: Benchmark of Quote Recommendations for Writing', 'tr': 'ReplyForward', 'af': 'ReplyForward', 'sq': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'hy': 'R: A BENCHMIK of Cite Empathy for Writing', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'bn': 'উদ্ধৃতি: লেখার জন্য একটি উদ্ধৃতি পরামর্শ', 'bs': 'ReplyForward', 'cs': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'et': 'QuoteR: Võrdlusnäitaja tsitaatide soovituse kirjutamiseks', 'ca': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'fi': 'QuoteR: Vertailu lainaussuosituksen kirjoittamiseen', 'jv': 'ReplyForward', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'QuoteR: A benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing', 'sk': 'CiteR: Primerjalna vrednost priporočila citatov za pisanje', 'bo': 'QuoteR: A Benchmark of Quote Recommendation for Writing'}
{'en': 'In recent years, researchers tend to pre-train ever-larger language models to explore the upper limit of deep models. However, large language model pre-training costs intensive computational resources, and most of the models are trained from scratch without reusing the existing pre-trained models, which is wasteful. In this paper, we propose bert2BERT, which can effectively transfer the knowledge of an existing smaller pre-trained model to a large model through parameter initialization and significantly improve the pre-training efficiency of the large model. Specifically, we extend the previous function-preserving method proposed in computer vision on the Transformer-based language model, and further improve it by proposing a novel method, advanced knowledge for large model’s initialization. In addition, a two-stage learning method is proposed to further accelerate the pre-training. We conduct extensive experiments on representative PLMs (e.g., BERT and GPT) and demonstrate that (1) our method can save a significant amount of training cost compared with baselines including learning from scratch, StackBERT and MSLT; (2) our method is generic and applicable to different types of pre-trained models. In particular, bert2BERT saves about 45% and 47% computational cost of pre-training BERT_{\\rm BASE} and GPT_{\\rm BASE} by reusing the models of almost their half sizes.', 'pt': 'É muito comum usar citações (citações) para tornar nossos escritos mais elegantes ou convincentes. Para ajudar as pessoas a encontrar citações adequadas de forma eficiente, apresenta-se a tarefa de recomendação de citações, com o objetivo de recomendar citações que se enquadrem no contexto atual da escrita. Houve várias abordagens de recomendação de cotação, mas elas são avaliadas em diferentes conjuntos de dados não publicados. Para facilitar a pesquisa sobre essa tarefa, criamos um conjunto de dados de recomendação de cotação grande e totalmente aberto chamado QuoteR, que compreende três partes, incluindo inglês, chinês padrão e chinês clássico. Qualquer parte dele é maior do que as contrapartes não publicadas anteriores. Conduzimos uma extensa avaliação dos métodos de recomendação de cotação existentes no QuoteR. Além disso, propomos um novo modelo de recomendação de cotação que supera significativamente os métodos anteriores em todas as três partes do QuoteR. Todo o código e dados deste artigo podem ser obtidos em https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'fr': "Il est très courant d'utiliser des citations (citations) pour rendre nos écrits plus élégants ou plus convaincants. Pour aider les gens à trouver efficacement des devis appropriés, la tâche de recommandation de devis est présentée, visant à recommander des citations qui correspondent au contexte actuel de la rédaction. Il existe différentes approches de recommandation de devis, mais elles sont évaluées sur différents ensembles de données non publiés. Pour faciliter la recherche sur cette tâche, nous créons un vaste ensemble de données de recommandation de devis entièrement ouvert appelé QuoTer, qui comprend trois parties, dont l'anglais, le chinois standard et le chinois classique. Toute partie de celui-ci est plus grande que les contreparties inédites précédentes. Nous effectuons une évaluation approfondie des méthodes de recommandation de devis existantes sur QuoTer. En outre, nous proposons un nouveau modèle de recommandation de devis qui surpasse largement les méthodes précédentes pour les trois parties de QuoTer. Tous les codes et données de ce document peuvent être obtenus à l'adresse https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.", 'ar': 'من الشائع جدًا استخدام الاقتباسات (الاقتباسات) لجعل كتاباتنا أكثر أناقة أو إقناعًا. لمساعدة الأشخاص في العثور على الاقتباسات المناسبة بكفاءة ، يتم تقديم مهمة توصية الاقتباس ، بهدف التوصية بالاقتباسات التي تناسب السياق الحالي للكتابة. كانت هناك طرق مختلفة لتوصية الاقتباس ، ولكن تم تقييمها على مجموعات بيانات مختلفة غير منشورة. لتسهيل البحث في هذه المهمة ، قمنا ببناء مجموعة بيانات توصية اقتباس كبيرة ومفتوحة بالكامل تسمى QuoteR ، والتي تتكون من ثلاثة أجزاء بما في ذلك اللغة الإنجليزية والصينية القياسية والصينية الكلاسيكية. أي جزء منه أكبر من نظرائه السابقة غير المنشورة. نجري تقييمًا شاملاً لأساليب توصية الاقتباس الحالية على QuoteR. علاوة على ذلك ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا لتوصية الاقتباس يتفوق بشكل كبير على الأساليب السابقة في الأجزاء الثلاثة من QuoteR. يمكن الحصول على جميع رموز وبيانات هذه الورقة على https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'es': 'Es muy común usar citas (comillas) para hacer que nuestros escritos sean más elegantes o convincentes. Para ayudar a las personas a encontrar las cotizaciones adecuadas de manera eficiente, se presenta la tarea de recomendación de cotizaciones, con el objetivo de recomendar cotizaciones que se ajusten al contexto actual de redacción. Ha habido varios enfoques de recomendación de cotizaciones, pero se evalúan en diferentes conjuntos de datos no publicados. Para facilitar la investigación sobre esta tarea, creamos un conjunto de datos de recomendaciones de cotizaciones amplio y completamente abierto llamado QuOter, que comprende tres partes que incluyen inglés, chino estándar y chino clásico. Cualquier parte es más grande que las contrapartes no publicadas anteriores. Llevamos a cabo una evaluación exhaustiva de los métodos de recomendación de cotizaciones existentes en QuOter. Además, proponemos un nuevo modelo de recomendación de cotizaciones que supera significativamente a los métodos anteriores en las tres partes de QuOter. Todo el código y los datos de este documento se pueden obtener en https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'zh': '用引文(引号)以雅吾文,信服常见。 为人得报价,举报价荐之任,指适时背景之报价。 有诸引用荐举之法,然于未发数集上为质。 便于此者,立QuoteR大开报价荐数集由三,包英语,标准中文古典中文。 其分大于未发之分。 吾于QuoteR上见报价荐法广评。 又新报价荐模,在QuoteR三者皆明优于前法。 本文所有代码数,皆得于 https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR 。', 'ja': '引用（引用）を使用して、私たちの著作をよりエレガントまたは説得力のあるものにすることは非常に一般的です。人々が適切な見積もりを効率的に見つけるのに役立つように、見積もり推奨のタスクが提示され、現在の書き込みの文脈に合った見積もりを推奨することを目指しています。さまざまな見積推奨アプローチがありますが、それらは異なる未公開データセットで評価されます。このタスクの研究を容易にするために、QuoteRと呼ばれる大規模で完全にオープンな見積もり推奨データセットを構築します。これは、英語、標準中国語、古典中国語の3つの部分で構成されています。そのいずれかの部分は、以前の未発表のカウンターパートよりも大きい。QuoteRでは既存の見積推奨方法を幅広く評価しています。さらに、QuoteRの3つの部分すべてで従来の手法を大幅に上回る新しい見積もり推奨モデルを提案します。この論文のすべてのコードとデータは、https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteRで入手できます。', 'hi': 'हमारे लेखन को और अधिक सुरुचिपूर्ण या आश्वस्त बनाने के लिए उद्धरण (उद्धरण) का उपयोग करना बहुत आम है। लोगों को उचित उद्धरण कुशलतासे खोजने में मदद करने के लिए, उद्धरण सिफारिश का कार्य प्रस्तुत किया जाता है, जिसका उद्देश्य उन उद्धरणों की सिफारिश करना है जो लेखन के वर्तमान संदर्भ में फिट होते हैं। विभिन्न उद्धरण सिफारिश दृष्टिकोण रहे हैं, लेकिन उनका मूल्यांकन विभिन्न अप्रकाशित डेटासेट पर किया जाता है। इस कार्य पर अनुसंधान को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए, हम QuoteR नामक एक बड़े और पूरी तरह से खुले उद्धरण सिफारिश डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं, जिसमें अंग्रेजी, मानक चीनी और शास्त्रीय चीनी सहित तीन भाग शामिल हैं। इसका कोई भी हिस्सा पिछले अप्रकाशित समकक्षों की तुलना में बड़ा है। हम QuoteR पर मौजूदा उद्धरण सिफारिश विधियों का एक व्यापक मूल्यांकन करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम एक नए उद्धरण सिफारिश मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो QuoteR के सभी तीन भागों पर पिछले तरीकों को काफी बेहतर बनाता है। इस पेपर के सभी कोड और डेटा https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR पर प्राप्त किए जा सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Очень часто цитаты (кавычки) используются для того, чтобы сделать наши труды более элегантными или убедительными. Чтобы помочь людям эффективно находить подходящие цитаты, предлагается задача рекомендации цитаты, направленная на то, чтобы рекомендовать цитаты, которые соответствуют текущему контексту написания. Существуют различные подходы, основанные на рекомендациях в отношении цитат, но они оцениваются на различных неопубликованных наборах данных. Чтобы облегчить исследование этой задачи, мы создаем большой и полностью открытый набор данных рекомендаций цитат под названием QuoteR, который состоит из трех частей, включая английский, стандартный китайский и классический китайский. Любая его часть больше, чем предыдущие неопубликованные экземпляры. Мы проводим обширную оценку существующих методов рекомендации котировок на QuoteR. Кроме того, мы предлагаем новую рекомендуемую модель цитаты, которая значительно превосходит предыдущие методы по всем трем частям QuoteR. Весь код и данные этой статьи можно получить по адресу https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ga': 'Tá sé an-choitianta athfhriotail (sleachta) a úsáid chun ár gcuid scríbhinní a dhéanamh níos galánta nó diongbháilte. Chun cabhrú le daoine comharthaí athfhriotail oiriúnacha a aimsiú go héifeachtach, cuirtear an tasc maidir le moltaí athfhriotail i láthair, dírithe ar shleachta a mholadh a oireann do chomhthéacs reatha na scríbhneoireachta. Bhí cineálacha cur chuige éagsúla molta athfhriotail ann, ach déantar iad a mheas ar thacair sonraí neamhfhoilsithe éagsúla. Chun an taighde ar an tasc seo a éascú, tógaimid tacar sonraí molta luachana mór agus iomlán oscailte ar a dtugtar QuoteR, a chuimsíonn trí chuid lena n-áirítear Béarla, Sínis chaighdeánach agus Sínis chlasaiceach. Tá aon chuid de níos mó ná a gcomhghleacaithe neamhfhoilsithe roimhe seo. Déanaimid meastóireacht fhairsing ar na modhanna reatha um mholta luachan ar QuoteR. Ina theannta sin, molaimid múnla molta athfhriotail nua a sháraíonn go mór na modhanna a bhí ann roimhe seo ar na trí chuid de QuoteR. Is féidir cód agus sonraí uile an pháipéir seo a fháil ag https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'el': 'Είναι πολύ συνηθισμένο να χρησιμοποιούμε εισαγωγές (αποσπάσματα) για να κάνουμε τα γραπτά μας πιο κομψά ή πειστικά. Για να βοηθήσει τους ανθρώπους να βρουν αποτελεσματικά κατάλληλα αποσπάσματα, παρουσιάζεται το έργο της σύστασης αποσπάσματος, με στόχο να προτείνουν αποσπάσματα που ταιριάζουν στο τρέχον πλαίσιο της γραφής. Υπάρχουν διάφορες προσεγγίσεις συστάσεων διατύπωσης, αλλά αξιολογούνται σε διαφορετικά μη δημοσιευμένα σύνολα δεδομένων. Για να διευκολυνθεί η έρευνα σε αυτό το έργο, χτίζουμε ένα μεγάλο και πλήρως ανοικτό σύνολο δεδομένων σύστασης προσφορών που ονομάζεται το οποίο αποτελείται από τρία μέρη, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των αγγλικών, των τυποποιημένων κινέζικων και των κλασικών κινέζικων. Οποιοδήποτε μέρος του είναι μεγαλύτερο από τα προηγούμενα αδημοσίευτα ομόλογα. Πραγματοποιούμε εκτενή αξιολόγηση των υφιστάμενων μεθόδων σύστασης προσφορών για την προσφορά. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο σύστασης προσφοράς που ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις προηγούμενες μεθόδους και στα τρία μέρη του. Όλος ο κώδικας και τα στοιχεία αυτού του εγγράφου μπορούν να ληφθούν στη διεύθυνση: https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'hu': 'Nagyon gyakori az idézetek (idézetek) használata, hogy írásaink elegánsabbak vagy meggyőzőbbek legyenek. Annak érdekében, hogy az emberek hatékonyan megtalálják a megfelelő idézeteket, bemutatják az idézet ajánlásának feladatát, amelynek célja, hogy olyan idézeteket ajánljon, amelyek megfelelnek az írás jelenlegi kontextusához. Különböző ajánlási megközelítések léteztek, de ezeket különböző, nem publikált adatkészleteken értékelik. A feladat kutatásának megkönnyítése érdekében építünk egy nagy és teljesen nyitott árajánlási adatkészletet QuoteR néven, amely három részből áll, beleértve az angol, a szabványos kínai és a klasszikus kínai. Bármely része nagyobb, mint a korábbi kiadatlan partnerek. Átfogó értékelést végzünk a meglévő ajánlási módszerekről a QuoteR-en. Továbbá javaslatunk egy új ajánlási modellt, amely jelentősen felülmúlja a korábbi módszereket a QuoteR mindhárom részén. A tanulmány összes kódja és adata a következő címen érhető el: https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანია გამოყენება კოტაციები (კუტაციები) რომ ჩვენი წერილები უფრო ელეგენტური ან გადარწმუნებელია. რომელიც ადამიანის შესაძლებელად დახმარება სწორი კუტატის ეფექტიურად აღმოჩენა, კუტატის რემუნეციის რაოდენობა იქნება, რომელიც უნდა მომხმარება კუ არსებობს განსხვავებული კიტატის მოწყობილობა, მაგრამ ისინი განსხვავებულ მონაცემების შესახებ განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესახებ. ამ დავალების შესაძლებლობისთვის გასწავლობა, ჩვენ შევქმნით დიდი და უფრო გახსნა კითხვის მოწყობინებების მონაცემები, რომელიც სამუშაობა ანგლისური, შინელი და კლასიკური კინ ყველა ნაწილი იყო უფრო დიდი, ვიდრე წინა არ გახსნა კომპორტები. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ სხვადასხვა განსაზღვრება სხვადასხვა განსაზღვრება სხვადასხვა განსაზღვრება სხვადასხვა განსაზღვრება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ახალი კიტატის რემპეკუმენტის მოდელს, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო გავაკეთებს წინახალი მეტოვები ყველა სამი ნაწილში კიტა ყველა კოდი და მონაცემები ამ გვერდის შეიძლება მიიღოთ https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'it': "È molto comune usare citazioni (citazioni) per rendere i nostri scritti più eleganti o convincenti. Per aiutare le persone a trovare citazioni appropriate in modo efficiente, viene presentato il compito di raccomandazione delle citazioni, con l'obiettivo di raccomandare citazioni che si adattano al contesto attuale della scrittura. Ci sono stati vari approcci di raccomandazione delle quotazioni, ma sono valutati su diversi set di dati inediti. Per facilitare la ricerca su questo compito, costruiamo un ampio e completamente aperto set di dati di raccomandazione delle quotazioni chiamato QuoteR, che comprende tre parti tra cui inglese, cinese standard e cinese classico. Qualsiasi parte di esso è più grande delle precedenti controparti inedite. Conduciamo una valutazione approfondita dei metodi di raccomandazione delle quotazioni esistenti su QuoteR. Inoltre, proponiamo un nuovo modello di raccomandazione preventivo che supera significativamente i metodi precedenti su tutte e tre le parti di QuoteR. Tutti i codici e i dati di questo documento possono essere ottenuti a https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.", 'kk': 'Біздің жазуларымызды жақсы немесе сенімді көмектесу үшін көмектесу көмектесілген. Көмектесу үшін адамдарға қолданылатын тапсырмаларды табуға көмектесу үшін, тапсырмаларды тапсырмалардың тапсырмасы көрсетіледі. Бұл тапсырмаларды қазіргі жазу кон Бірнеше тіркелген таңдау керектері бар, бірақ олар әртүрлі жазылмаған деректер жиындарында бағалады. Бұл тапсырманың зерттеулерін көмектесу үшін біз QuoteR деп аталатын үлкен және толық ашық тапсырмалардың деректер жинағын құрамыз. Бұл үш бөлігін ағылшын, стандартты қытайша жә Оның барлық бөлігі алдыңғы жазылмаған партнерден үлкен. Біз қолданыстағы таңбалау әдістерін қолданып, quoteR және қолданыстағы таңбалау әдістерін шектеп береміз. Қосымша, біз жаңа таңдау үлгісін таңдаймыз. Бұл таңдау үлгісінің алдыңғы әдістерін таңдаймыз. Бұл қағаздың барлық коды мен деректері https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'lt': 'Labai dažna naudoti citacijas, kad mūsų raštai taptų elegantesni arba įtikinantys. Siekiant padėti žmonėms veiksmingai rasti tinkamas citacijas, pateikiama rekomendacijos dėl citacijų užduotis, kuria siekiama rekomenduoti citacijas, atitinkančias dabartinę rašytinę aplinkybę. Buvo taikomi įvairūs rekomendaciniai metodai, tačiau jie vertinami pagal skirtingus nepaskelbtus duomenų rinkinius. Siekiant palengvinti šios užduoties mokslinius tyrimus, sukuriame didelį ir visiškai atvirą rekomendacijų rinkinį, vadinamą QuoteR, kurį sudaro trys dalys, įskaitant anglų kalbą, standartinius kinus ir klasikinius kinus. Bet kuri jos dalis yra didesnė nei anksčiau nepaskelbti sandorio šalys. Atliekame išsamų esamų rekomendacijų dėl kvotų metodų vertinimą. Furthermore, we propose a new quote recommendation model that significantly outperforms previous methods on all three parts of QuoteR.  All the code and data of this paper can be obtained at  https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'mk': 'Многу е често да се користат цитати (цитати) за да се направи нашите писма поелегантни или убедливи. За да им се помогне на луѓето ефикасно да најдат соодветни цитати, се претставува задачата за цитатирање препорака, со цел да се препорачат цитати кои се совпаѓаат со сегашниот контекст на пишувањето. Постојат различни пристапи на препораките за цитирање, но тие се проценети на различни необјавени податоци. За да го олесниме истражувањето на оваа задача, градиме голем и целосно отворен набор на податоци за препораки наречен QuoteR, кој сочинува три дела вклучувајќи англиски, стандарден кинески и класичен кинески. Секој дел е поголем од претходните необјавени колеги. Ние спроведуваме екстремна проценка на постојните методи на препорака за цитати за QuoteR. Покрај тоа, предложуваме нов модел на препорака за цитати кој значително ги надминува претходните методи на сите три делови од QuoteR. Сите кодови и податоци на оваа хартија се наоѓаат на https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ms': 'Ia sangat biasa untuk menggunakan petikan untuk membuat tulisan kita lebih elegan atau meyakinkan. Untuk membantu orang mencari kutipan yang sesuai dengan efisien, tugas rekomendasi kutipan dipaparkan, bertujuan untuk mencadangkan kutipan yang sesuai dengan konteks tulisan semasa. Terdapat pelbagai pendekatan rekomendasi kutipan, tetapi mereka diteliti pada set data yang tidak diterbitkan berbeza. Untuk memudahkan penyelidikan tugas ini, kami membina set data rekomendasi kutipan yang besar dan terbuka sepenuhnya bernama QuoteR, yang mengandungi tiga bahagian termasuk bahasa Inggeris, Cina piawai dan Cina klasik. Setiap bahagian ia lebih besar daripada rakan-rakan yang belum diterbitkan sebelumnya. Kami melakukan penilaian luas kaedah rekomendasi kutipan yang ada pada QuoteR. Lagipun, kami cadangkan model cadangan kutipan baru yang jauh melebihi kaedah terdahulu pada semua tiga bahagian QuoteR. Semua kod dan data kertas ini boleh dicapai di https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ml': 'നമ്മുടെ എഴുത്തുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയോ വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നതോ ആക്കാന്\u200d വളരെ സാധാരണമാണ്. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ആളുകളെ സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d, ഉദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം കൊണ്ടുവന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ എ വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രസിദ്ധമില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പരിപാടികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടായി ഈ ജോലിയിലെ പരിശോധന സുരക്ഷിതമാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ, പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും തുറന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന കൌട്ടേഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പണിയുന്നു.  Any part of it is larger than previous unpublished counterparts.  നിലവിലുള്ള വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്ന രീതികളുടെ വിശാലമായ പരിഗണന നടത്തുന്നു. അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്ന ശുപാര്\u200dശ മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് മുമ്പ് മൂന്ന് ഭാ ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ എല്ലാ കോഡും ഡേറ്റായും ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'mt': "Huwa komuni ħafna li jintużaw kwotazzjonijiet (kwotazzjonijiet) biex il-kitbiet tagħna jsiru aktar eleganti jew konvinċenti. Biex jgħin lin-nies isibu kwotazzjonijiet xierqa b’mod effiċjenti, il-kompitu tar-rakkomandazzjoni tal-kwotazzjonijiet huwa ppreżentat, bil-għan li jirrakkomandaw kwotazzjonijiet li jaqblu mal-kuntest attwali tal-kitba. Kien hemm diversi approċċi ta’ rakkomandazzjoni ta’ kwotazzjoni, iżda huma evalwati fuq settijiet ta’ dejta differenti mhux ippubblikati. Biex niffaċilitaw ir-riċerka dwar dan il-kompitu, a ħna nibnu sett ta’ dejta kbir u miftuħ għal kollox dwar rakkomandazzjonijiet ta’ kwotazzjoni msejjaħ QuoteR, li jinkludi tliet partijiet inklużi l-Ingliż, iċ-Ċiniż standard u ċ-Ċiniż klassiku. Kwalunkwe parti minnha hija akbar minn kontropartijiet mhux ippubblikati preċedenti. Għandna nagħmlu evalwazzjoni estensiva tal-metodi eżistenti ta’ rakkomandazzjoni ta’ kwotazzjoni dwar il-QuoteR. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid ta' rakkomandazzjoni ta' kwotazzjoni li jaqbeż b'mod sinifikanti l-metodi preċedenti fuq it-tliet partijiet kollha tal-QuoteR. Il-kodiċi u d-dejta kollha ta’ dan id-dokument jistgħu jinkisbu fuq https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.", 'pl': 'Bardzo powszechne jest używanie cytatów (cytatów), aby uczynić nasze pisma bardziej eleganckimi lub przekonującymi. Aby pomóc ludziom skutecznie znaleźć odpowiednie cytaty, przedstawiono zadanie rekomendacji cytatów, mające na celu rekomendację cytatów pasujących do aktualnego kontekstu pisania. Istnieją różne podejścia do rekomendacji cytatów, ale są one oceniane na podstawie różnych niepublikowanych zbiorów danych. Aby ułatwić badania nad tym zadaniem, budujemy duży i w pełni otwarty zestaw danych rekomendacji ofert o nazwie QuoteR, który składa się z trzech części, w tym angielskiego, chińskiego standardowego i chińskiego klasycznego. Każda jego część jest większa niż poprzednie niepublikowane odpowiedniki. Przeprowadzamy szeroką ocenę istniejących metod rekomendacji ofert na QuoteR. Ponadto proponujemy nowy model rekomendacji ofert, który znacznie przewyższa poprzednie metody we wszystkich trzech częściach QuoteR. Cały kod i dane niniejszego artykułu można uzyskać pod adresem: https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'no': 'Det er svært vanleg å bruka kvotasjonar (citasjonar) for å gjera skrivinga våre mer elegante eller overbevare. For å hjelpa folk å finna tilgjengelege siteringstiltak effektivt, vert oppgåva til siteringsanbefaling presentert, som må anbefalt siteringstiltak som passar til den gjeldande skrivekonteksten. Det har vært forskjellige tilnærmingar for siteringsanbefaling, men dei er evaluerte på ulike datasett som ikkje er publisert. For å letta forskningen på denne oppgåva bygger vi eit stor og fullstendig opna siteringsrekomendassett kalla QuoteR, som inneheld tre deler inkludert engelsk, standardskinesisk og klassisk kinesisk. Alle delene av det er større enn førre ubluserte trekantar. Vi gjev eit utvida evaluering av eksisterande siteringsanbefalingsmetodar på QuoteR. I tillegg foreslår vi eit nytt siteringsanbefalingsmodell som utfører tidlegare metodar på alle tre deler av QuoteR. Alle koden og data av denne papiret kan hentast på https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ro': 'Este foarte obișnuit să folosiți citate (citate) pentru a face scrierile noastre mai elegante sau mai convingătoare. Pentru a ajuta oamenii să găsească ofertele corespunzătoare eficient, este prezentată sarcina recomandării ofertelor, având ca scop recomandarea ofertelor care se potrivesc contextului actual al scrierii. Au existat diferite abordări de recomandare a citatelor, dar acestea sunt evaluate pe diferite seturi de date nepublicate. Pentru a facilita cercetarea cu privire la această sarcină, construim un set larg și complet deschis de date pentru recomandări de cotații numit QuoteR, care cuprinde trei părți, inclusiv engleză, chineză standard și chineză clasică. Orice parte a acestuia este mai mare decât omologii nepublicați anterior. Realizăm o evaluare amplă a metodelor existente de recomandare a ofertelor pe QuoteR. În plus, propunem un nou model de recomandare a ofertelor care depășește semnificativ metodele anterioare pe toate cele trei părți ale QuoteR. Toate codurile și datele din această lucrare pot fi obținute la https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'mn': 'Бидний бичгийг илүү үзэсгэлэнтэй эсвэл итгэлтэй болгохын тулд жишээлүүдийг ашиглах нь маш ихэвчлэн юм. Хүмүүст зөвхөн тохиолдлуудыг үр дүнтэй олохын тулд, дуудлагын зөвлөлтийн даалгавар илэрхийлэгддэг. Одоогийн бичих тохиолдлуудыг зөвлөх зорилго. Өөр хэлбэл хэлэлцээгүй өгөгдлийн сангуудын тухай дүгнэлт гарсан. Энэ ажлын судалгааны тухай амжилттай болгохын тулд бид QuoteR гэдэг нэр дэвшүүлэлтийн өгөгдлийн санг бүтээж, Англи, стандарт Хятад, классик Хятад гэдэг гурван хэсэг болно. Эдгээрийн аль нэг хэсэг нь өмнө нээлттэй хамтрагчдаас их. Бид "QuoteR" дээр суурилсан үлгэрүүлэх тайлбарын аргыг олон тооны үнэлгээ хийдэг. Үүнээс гадна бид Цитерийн 3 хэсэгт өнгөрсөн арга загварыг илүү үр дүнтэй болгодог шинэ хэлэлцээний загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ цаасны бүх код болон өгөгдлийг https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'so': 'Waa mid aad u caadi ah in la isticmaalo quraanka (quraanka) in qoraalkayaga ay ka dhigto mid aad u fahan ama aad u aaminsan. Si loo caawiyo dadka in loo helo qoraal habboon, waxaa la soo saaraa talo-bixinta quraanka, waxaana lagu talo galaa in lagu talo bixiyo quraanka ku habboon qoritaanka. Waxaa jirtay marxalado la talin karo, laakiin waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa kooxda macluumaad kala duduwan oo aan la soo daabacayn. To facilitate the research on this task, we build a large and fully open quote recommendation dataset called QuoteR, which comprises three parts including English, standard Chinese and classical Chinese.  Qayb kasta oo ay ka weyn tahay saaxiibbadii hore oo aan la soo daayay. Waxaannu sameynaa qiimeyn dheer oo ku saabsan qaababka la talinayo ee quoteR. Furthermore, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model cusub oo talo-bixinta qof ah oo si muhiim ah u sameeya qaabab hore oo ku qoran saddexda qayb oo quoteR. Kaarka iyo macluumaadka warqadan oo dhan waxaad ka heli kartaa https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'sv': 'Det är mycket vanligt att använda citat (citat) för att göra våra skrifter mer eleganta eller övertygande. För att hjälpa människor att hitta lämpliga citat effektivt presenteras uppgiften med citat rekommendation, som syftar till att rekommendera citat som passar det aktuella sammanhanget i skrivandet. Det har funnits olika sätt att rekommendera citat, men de utvärderas på olika opublicerade datauppsättningar. För att underlätta forskningen kring denna uppgift bygger vi en stor och helt öppen offertrekommendationsdata kallad QuoteR, som består av tre delar inklusive engelska, standardkinesiska och klassisk kinesiska. Varje del av den är större än tidigare opublicerade motsvarigheter. Vi genomför en omfattande utvärdering av befintliga metoder för offertrekommendation på QuoteR. Dessutom föreslår vi en ny modell för offertrekommendation som avsevärt överträffar tidigare metoder på alla tre delarna av QuoteR. All kod och data i detta dokument kan erhållas på https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'sr': 'Vrlo je često koristiti kvotacije (citate) da bi naša pisanja bila elegantnija ili uvjerljivija. Da bi pomogli ljudima da nađu odgovarajuće citate efikasno, predstavlja se zadatak preporuke citata, cilj da preporučuje citate koje odgovaraju trenutnom kontekstu pisanja. Postoje različiti pristupi preporukama citata, ali se procjenjuju na različitim nepublicenim podacima. Da bismo olakšali istraživanje ovog zadatka, izgradili smo veliku i potpuno otvorenu preporuku za citate podataka po imenu QuoteR, koja sadrži tri dijela uključujući engleski, standardnu kinesku i klasičnu kinesku. Svaki deo je veći od prethodnih nepublicenih kolega. Provodimo široku procjenu postojećih metoda preporuke citata o QuoteR-u. Osim toga, predlažemo novi model preporuke citata koji značajno iznosi prethodne metode na svim tri dijelova QuoteR. Svi šifre i podaci ovog papira mogu dobiti na https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'si': 'ඒක ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය යුතුයි අපේ ලිපියුම් විශ්වාස කරනවා නැත්තම් විශ්වාස කරන්න. මිනිස්සුන්ට උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් කිරීමක් හොයාගන්න, කිරීමක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, අධ්\u200dයයය ලියන වෙනස් කිරීමක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒත් ඔවුන් වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති දත්ත සේට් වල විශේෂ කරනවා. මේ වැඩේ පරීක්ෂණය සහාය කරන්න, අපි ලොකු සහ සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හදන්නේ කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා ක ඒකේ හැම කොටසෙක්ම පිළිබඳ නොපිළිබඳ විදිහට වඩා වැඩියි. අපි විශාල විශාල විශාලනයක් කරනවා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා. ඉතින්, අපි අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා ක මේ පත්තරේ හැම කෝඩ සහ දත්ත ගන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ta': 'It is very common to use quotations (quotes) to make our writings more elegant or convincing.  தேவையான குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க மக்களுக்கு உதவுகிறது, மேலும் குறிப்பு பரிந்துரைகள் கொடுக்கப்படுகிறது, தற்போதைய எழுதும்  பல்வேறு மேற்கோள் பரிந்துரைகள் உள்ளன, ஆனால் அவை வேறு வெளிப்படையாக்கப்படாத தரவுத்தளங்களில் மதிப்பிடப்படு இந்த வேலையில் ஆராய்ச்சியை எளிதாக்க, நாம் ஒரு பெரிய மற்றும் முழுமையாக திறந்த முறையான குறிப்பு பரிந்துரைப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பை உரு முந்தைய வெளிப்படுத்தப்படாத எதிரிகளை விட எந்த பகுதியிலும் பெரியது. நாங்கள் இருக்கும் கூற்று பரிந்துரைகள் முறைமைகளை விரிவாக ஆராய்வு செய்கிறோம். மேலும், நாம் முந்தைய முறைமைகளில் மூன்று பகுதிகளிலும் முன்னேறிய முறைமைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம். இந்த காகிதத்தின் அனைத்து குறியீடுகளும் தகவலும் பெற முடியும் https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ur': 'یہ بہت معمول ہے کہ ہمارے لکھنے کے لئے بہت زیادہ اچھی یا مطمئن کر دیں. لوگوں کی مدد کرنے کے لئے مناسب اعلان کے مطابق مطابق تلاش کرنے کے لئے، اعلان کی سفارش کی کوشش پیش کیے جاتی ہے، اس کا مطابق یہ ہے کہ اعلان کی سفارش کریں جو موجود منظور لکھنے کے مطابق مناسب ہیں. مختلف قوانین کی سفارش کے مطابق موجود ہیں، لیکن وہ مختلف بغیر پوشاک ڈیٹ سٹ پر مطابق کیا جاتا ہے. اس کام کے تحقیق کو آسان کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک بڑے اور کامل کھول دینے والی اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا سامان بناتے ہیں، جو انگلیسی، استاندارڈ چینی اور کلاسیک چینی کے شامل تی اس میں سے ہر قسم کی بڑی ہے پہلے بغیر قائم ہوئی شرکتوں سے۔ ہم کوٹر کے بارے میں موجود اوٹر کی مہربانی طریقے کا ایک بڑا ارزش کرتے ہیں. اور اس کے علاوہ ہم نے ایک نئی قول کی تعلیم مدل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو اگلے طریقے کو کیٹر کے تین قسموں پر زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ کی تمام کوڈ اور ڈیٹا حاصل کر سکتے ہیں https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'uz': "Bizning yozularimizni ko'proq va ishonch qilishimiz juda oddiy foydalanuvchi. @ info: whatsthis @ info Bu vazifani o'rganishga yordam berish uchun biz quoteR deb nomli katta va butun ochilgan imkoniyatlar maʼlumotini yaratib turamiz. Bu ingliz, стандарт Xitoycha va klassik Xitoycha kabi uchta qismlarni yaratadi. Buning bir qismi oldingi tashkilotlardan katta. Biz quote R haqida mavjud quvvat soʻzlar usullarini qiymatimiz. Ko'rsatganda, biz yangi quote soʻzning modelini rivojlanishimiz mumkin, bu oldingi usullarning hamma uchta qismlariga bajaradi. Ushbu qogʻozning hamma kodlash va maʼlumotlar https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.", 'vi': 'Rất phổ biến sử dụng những trích dẫn (trích dẫn) để làm những văn bản của chúng ta thanh lịch hay thuyết phục hơn. Để giúp người ta tìm các trích dẫn thích hợp, nhiệm vụ gợi ý trích dẫn được trình bày, nhằm mục đích gợi ý các trích dẫn phù hợp với bối cảnh viết. Có nhiều phương pháp đề nghị trích dẫn khác nhau, nhưng chúng được đánh giá trên các tập tin chưa xuất bản khác nhau. Để dễ dàng nghiên cứu về nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi xây dựng một tập tin trích dẫn đầy đủ lớn được gọi là QuoteR, gồm ba phần bao gồm Anh, Trung Quốc tiêu chuẩn và Trung Quốc cổ điển. Phần nào của nó lớn hơn các đối tác chưa xuất bản trước. Chúng tôi tiến hành một đánh giá sâu về các phương pháp trích dẫn hiện thời về QuoteR. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình khuyến cáo mới có khả năng cao hơn các phương pháp trước trên ba phần của QuoteR. Tất cả mã và dữ liệu của tờ giấy này có thể lấy được tại https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'da': 'Det er meget almindeligt at bruge citater (citater) til at gøre vores skrifter mere elegante eller overbevisende. For at hjælpe folk med at finde passende citater effektivt, præsenteres opgaven med citatanbefaling, der sigter mod at anbefale citater, der passer til den aktuelle kontekst af skrivning. Der har været forskellige tilgange til anbefaling af citater, men de evalueres på forskellige upublicerede datasæt. For at lette forskningen i denne opgave bygger vi et stort og fuldt åbent datasæt til anbefalinger af tilbud kaldet QuoteR, som består af tre dele herunder engelsk, standard kinesisk og klassisk kinesisk. Enhver del af det er større end tidligere upublicerede modparter. Vi foretager en omfattende evaluering af eksisterende metoder til anbefaling af tilbud på QuoteR. Derudover foreslår vi en ny model til anbefaling af tilbud, der i høj grad overgår tidligere metoder på alle tre dele af QuoteR. Alle kode og data i dette papir kan fås på https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'bg': 'Много често се използват цитати (цитати), за да направят нашите писания по-елегантни или убедителни. За да се помогне на хората да намерят подходящи цитати ефективно, е представена задачата за препоръка на цитати, с цел да се препоръчат цитати, които отговарят на текущия контекст на писането. Има различни подходи за препоръки за цитати, но те се оценяват на различни непубликувани набори от данни. За да улесним изследванията по тази задача, ние изграждаме голям и напълно отворен набор от данни за препоръки за оферти, наречен който се състои от три части, включително английски, стандартен китайски и класически китайски. Всяка част от нея е по-голяма от предишните непубликувани колеги. Извършваме обширна оценка на съществуващите методи за препоръка за оферти в КвотеР. Освен това предлагаме нов модел на препоръка за оферти, който значително надминава предишните методи за трите части на КвотеР. Всички кодове и данни на тази статия могат да бъдат получени на адрес: https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'hr': 'Vrlo je često koristiti kvotacije (citate) kako bi naša pisanja učinila elegantnijim ili uvjerljivijim. Da bi ljudima pomogla pronaći odgovarajuće citate učinkovito, predstavlja se zadatak preporuke citata, cilj preporučujući citate koje odgovaraju trenutnom kontekstu pisanja. Postoje različiti pristupi preporukama citata, ali se procjenjuju na različitim nepublicenim podacima. Da bismo olakšali istraživanje ovog zadatka, izgradili smo veliku i potpuno otvorenu preporuku za citate podataka po imenu QuoteR, koja sadrži tri dijela uključujući engleski, standardnu kinesku i klasičnu kinesku. Svaki dio toga je veći od prethodnih nepublicenih kolega. Provodimo široku procjenu postojećih metoda preporuke citata o QuoteR-u. Nadalje, predlažemo novi model preporuke citata koji značajno nadmašuje prethodne metode na svim tri dijelova QuoteR. Svi šifre i podaci ovog papira mogu dobiti na https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'nl': 'Het is heel gebruikelijk om citaten (citaten) te gebruiken om onze geschriften eleganter of overtuigender te maken. Om mensen te helpen passende citaten efficiënt te vinden, wordt de taak van citaten aanbeveling gepresenteerd, gericht op het aanbevelen van citaten die passen bij de huidige context van schrijven. Er zijn verschillende benaderingen van citaten aanbevolen, maar deze worden geëvalueerd op verschillende ongepubliceerde datasets. Om het onderzoek naar deze taak te vergemakkelijken, bouwen we een grote en volledig open quote aanbeveling dataset genaamd QuoteR, die bestaat uit drie delen waaronder Engels, standaard Chinees en klassiek Chinees. Elk deel ervan is groter dan eerdere ongepubliceerde tegenhangers. We voeren een uitgebreide evaluatie uit van bestaande methoden voor offerte aanbeveling op QuoteR. Verder stellen we een nieuw offerteadvies model voor dat significant overtreft eerdere methoden op alle drie de onderdelen van QuoteR. Alle code en gegevens van dit document zijn te verkrijgen op: https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'de': 'Es ist sehr üblich, Zitate (Zitate) zu verwenden, um unsere Schriften eleganter oder überzeugender zu machen. Um Menschen dabei zu helfen, geeignete Zitate effizient zu finden, wird die Aufgabe der Angebotsempfehlung vorgestellt, mit dem Ziel, Zitate zu empfehlen, die zum aktuellen Kontext des Schreibens passen. Es gab verschiedene Ansätze zur Angebotsempfehlung, aber sie werden auf verschiedenen unveröffentlichten Datensätzen ausgewertet. Um die Recherche zu dieser Aufgabe zu erleichtern, erstellen wir einen großen und vollständig offenen Angebotsempfehlungsdatensatz namens QuoteR, der aus drei Teilen besteht, darunter Englisch, Standardchinesisch und klassisches Chinesisch. Jeder Teil davon ist größer als vorherige unveröffentlichte Pendants. Wir führen eine umfangreiche Evaluation bestehender Methoden zur Angebotsempfehlung auf QuoteR durch. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir ein neues Angebotsempfehlungsmodell vor, das bisherige Methoden auf allen drei Teilen von QuoteR deutlich übertrifft. Der gesamte Code und die Daten dieser Arbeit können unter folgender Adresse abgerufen werden: https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'sw': 'Ni jambo la kawaida kutumia nukuu (nukuu) kufanya maandiko yetu kuwa na uelewa au wenye ushawishi zaidi. Ili kuwasaidia watu kutafuta nukuu zilizofanana kwa ufanisi, jukumu la pendekezo la nukuu linaletwa, kwa lengo la kupendekeza nukuu zinazofanikiwa na muktadha wa sasa wa kuandika. Kumekuwa na mapendekezo mbalimbali ya nukuu, lakini yanapitiwa kwenye seti mbalimbali zilizochapishwa. Ili kusaidia utafiti juu ya kazi hii, tunajenga seti kubwa na wazi ya mapendekezo ya nukuu inayoitwa QuoteR, ambayo ina sehemu tatu ikiwa ni pamoja na Kiingereza, Kichina na Kiklasi. Sehemu yoyote hiyo ni kubwa zaidi ya wapenzi waliochapishwa hapo awali. Tunafanya uchunguzi wa kina wa njia za pendekezo zilizopo kwenye nukuu za QuoteR. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza modeli mpya ya pendekezo la nukuu ambayo kwa kiasi kikubwa inafanya mbinu za zamani katika sehemu tatu za QuoteR. Alama zote na taarifa za karatasi hii inaweza kupatikana katika https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'fa': 'خیلی معمولی است که از نوشته\u200cها استفاده کنیم تا نوشته\u200cهایمان را زیبا یا قانع کننده\u200cتر کنیم. تا به مردم کمک کند که به طور مثبت عبارت مناسب پیدا کنند، وظیفه توصیف نوشتن را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند، که هدف می\u200cدهد که توصیف دهند که به موقعیت نوشتن مناسب است. دسترسی پیشنهاد های نقل مختلف وجود دارد، ولی آنها در مجموعه های داده های متفاوت غیر قابل تحقیق می شوند. برای آسانی تحقیقات این کار، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای پیشنهاد بزرگ و کاملا باز به نام QuoteR ساختیم، که سه بخش شامل انگلیسی، چینی استاندارد و چینی کلاسیک است. هر بخشی از آن بزرگتر از همکاران پیشین است. ما ارزیابی بسیار زیادی از روش پیشنهاد یادآوری موجود در مورد QuoteR انجام می دهیم. علاوه بر این، ما یک مدل پیشنهاد جدید نقل را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که در تمام سه قسمت\u200cهای نقل\u200cآر، روش\u200cهای قبلی را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. تمام کد و داده های این کاغذ می توانند در https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ko': '인용어록 (인용부호) 이 우리의 문장을 더욱 우아하게 하거나 설득력 있게 하는 것은 흔히 볼 수 있는 일이다.사람들이 적당한 인용어를 효율적으로 찾을 수 있도록 하기 위해 본고는 인용어 추천 임무를 제시했고 현재 작문 환경에 적합한 인용어를 추천하고자 한다.각종 견적 추천 방법이 있지만, 그것들은 서로 다른 미발표 데이터 집합에서 평가된다.본 과제의 연구를 편리하게 하기 위해 우리는 대형, 완전 개방된 견적 추천 데이터 집합QuoteR을 구축했다. 이 데이터 집합은 영어, 표준 중국어와 문언 세 부분으로 구성된다.그것의 어떤 부분도 이전에 출판되지 않은 판본보다 크다.우리는 견적인의 기존 견적 추천 방법에 대해 광범위한 평가를 진행하였다.그 밖에 우리는 새로운 견적 추천 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 견적인의 모든 세 부분에서 이전의 방법보다 현저히 우수하다.본문의 모든 코드와 데이터는https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'af': "Dit is baie gemeenskap om kvotasies (citasies) te gebruik om ons skrywings meer elegante of oortreding te maak. Om mense te help vind geskikte citasies effektief, word die taak van siteringsaanbeveling voorgeskryf, met die doel om citasies te aanbeveel wat die huidige konteks van skryf pas. Daar is verskillende aanbevelingsaanbeveling toegang, maar hulle word uitgewerk op verskillende onverskillende datastelle. Om die ondersoek op hierdie taak te eenvoudig, bou ons 'n groot en volledig oopgemaak aanbeveling datastel genaamd QuoteR, wat drie dele insluitend Engels, standaard Sjinees en klassieke Sjinees bevat. Enige deel daarvan is groter as vorige ongepubliseerde kunstenaars. Ons doen 'n uitbreiding evaluering van bestaande sitering aanbeveling metodes op QuoteR. Maar ons voorstel 'n nuwe aanbeveling model wat betekenlik voortgaan voorige metodes op alle drie dele van QuoteR. Alle kode en data van hierdie papier kan ontvang word by https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.", 'sq': 'Është shumë e zakonshme të përdorim citime për të bërë shkrimet tona më elegante apo bindëse. Për të ndihmuar njerëzit të gjejnë citat e përshtatshme me efektshmëri, detyra e rekomandimit të citave paraqet, duke synuar të rekomandojnë citat që përshtaten në kontekstin aktual të shkrimit. Ka pasur metoda të ndryshme rekomandimi, por ato vlerësohen në grupe të dhënash të ndryshme të papublikuara. To facilitate the research on this task, we build a large and fully open quote recommendation dataset called QuoteR, which comprises three parts including English, standard Chinese and classical Chinese.  Çdo pjesë e saj është më e madhe se homologët e papublikuar të mëparshëm. Ne kryejmë një vlerësim të gjerë të metodave ekzistuese të rekomandimit të citave mbi QuoteR. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë një model të ri rekomandimi të citave që ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më shumë se metodat e mëparshme në të tre pjesët e QuoteR. Të gjitha kodet dhe të dhënat e kësaj letre mund të merren në https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'tr': 'Yazılarımızı daha sert ya da ikna etmek için sitelerimizi kullanmak çok yaygın. Adamlara uygun gabat tapmakda kömek etmek üçin, sitat maslahatlaryň buýruky maslahat edilýär. Bu nusga häzirki ýazma kontekstine golaýlaýan çykyşlary maslahat berilýär. Çeşitli çykyş teklip maslahat golaýlary bar, ýöne olar beýleki gabdalmaýan veri setirlerinde deňlenýärler. Bu zadyň barlagyny bejermek üçin, biz "quoteR" diýip atlandyran uly we doly a çyk sitetleri (quoteR) teklip etmek üçin beýleki bölekler, iňlisçe, standart Çinçe we klassiýa Çinçe diýipdir. Onuň hemme bölegi öňki bolmadyk sanlaryndan uly. Biz bu durumda "QuoteR" döwletlerini çykyp durup görýäris. Munuň üçin "QuoteR" üç bölüminde öňki yönden çykan täze bir sitm maslahat täbligini teklip edip bilýäris. Bu häzirki senediň ähli kodi we maglumaty berilip biler https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'am': 'ጽሑፎቻችንን አብልጦ እንዲያሳውቅ ወይም እንዲያረጋግጥ እጅግ ትልቅ ነው፡፡ To help people find appropriate quotes efficiently, the task of quote recommendation is presented, aiming to recommend quotes that fit the current context of writing.  የተለያዩ የፊደል ጉዳይ መግቢያዎች አሉ፥ ነገር ግን በተለየ ያልታወቀ የዳታ መስመር ላይ ይሸክማሉ፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ላይ ትምህርት ለማግኘት፣ ቁoteR የሚባል ትልቅ እና ሙሉ የተከፈተ የጽሑፍ ጉዳይ ዳታተር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከቀድሞ ያልታወቀው ተቃዋሚዎች የበለጠ አንዱ ክፍል ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን የቁጥጥር ማስታወቂያ ሥርዓት በቁጥጥር ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ በሦስት ክፍሎች ላይ ባለፉት ሥርዓቶችን በሚያሳየው አዲስ የጉዳይ ጉዳይ ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የዚህ ገጽ ኮድ እና ዳታ ሁሉ በመግኘት ይችላል https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'hy': 'Շատ տարածված է մեջբերումներ օգտագործել, որպեսզի մեր գրքերը ավելի էլեգանտ կամ համոզող դարձնեն: To help people find appropriate quotes efficiently, the task of quote recommendation is presented, aiming to recommend quotes that fit the current context of writing.  Գոյություն ունեին բազմաթիվ խորհուրդ տալու մոտեցումներ, բայց դրանք գնահատվում են տարբեր անհրապարակված տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Այս խնդրի ուսումնասիրությունը հեշտացնելու համար մենք կառուցում ենք մեծ և ամբողջովին բաց խորհուրդների համակարգ, որը կոչվում է Քոտեր, որը կազմում է երեք մաս, ներառյալ անգլերեն, ստանդարտ չինական և դասական չինական: Դրա ցանկացած մասը ավելի մեծ է, քան նախորդ անհրապարակված գործընկերները: Մենք կատարում ենք գոյություն ունեցող մեջբերումների խորհուրդման մեթոդների էքսպանցիոնալ գնահատականը Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեջբերման խորհուրդ մոդել, որը նշանակաբար գերազանցում է նախորդ մեթոդները մեջբերման բոլոր երեք մասերում: Այս թղթի բոլոր կոդները և տվյալները կարող են ստանալ https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'az': 'Yazılarımızı daha güclü və daha ikna etmək üçün sitayiş etmək çox yaygındır. İnsanlara uyğun sitatları faydalı olaraq tapmağa yardım etmək üçün, sitatların tövsiyəsini göstəriləcək, həmin məlumatın yazmaq məlumatına uyğun sitatları tövsiyə etmək üçün. Müxtəlif sitayiş təbliğ təbliğləri var, amma onlar müxtəlif təbliğ edilməmiş veri setlərində değerlənirlər. Bu iş barəsindəki araştırmaları asanlaşdırmaq üçün, QuoteR adlı büyük və tamamilə a çıq bir sitat verilən verilənlər qurduq. Bu, İngilizə, Standart Çincə və Klasik Çinlə birlikdə üç bölüm içərir. Onun hər bir parçası əvvəlki təbliğ edilməmiş ortaqlarından daha böyükdür. Biz Qıdırma üçün mövcuddur sitat təsirlərinin metodlarını çox çəkirik. Daha sonra, biz yeni sitayiş tövsiyə modelini təbliğ edirik ki, əvvəlki metodların hər üç hissəsində Qıdırmaq üçün əvvəlki metodların üstünə çıxarır. Bu kağıdın bütün kodu və verilər https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'bn': 'আমাদের লেখাগুলোকে আরো বুদ্ধিমান অথবা বিশ্বাস করার জন্য উদ্ধৃতি ব্যবহার করা খুব সাধারণ। মানুষের সাহায্য করার জন্য যথাযথ উদ্ধৃতি খুঁজে বের করার জন্য, উদ্ধৃতির পরামর্শ উপস্থাপন করা হয়েছে, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে বর্তমান প্রে বিভিন্ন উদ্ধৃতির পরামর্শ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু বিভিন্ন অপ্রকাশিত তথ্য সেটে তাদের মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। এই কাজে গবেষণার সুযোগ প্রদান করার জন্য আমরা একটি বিশাল এবং পুরোপুরি উন্মুক্ত উদ্ধৃতি তথ্য সুপারিশেট তৈরি করি, যার মধ্যে ইংরেজি, স্থান্যান পূর্ববর্তী প্রকাশিত প্রতিপক্ষের চেয়ে যে কোন অংশ তা বড়। আমরা বিদ্যমান উদ্ধৃতি সুপারিশ পদ্ধতির ব্যাপারে বিস্তারিত মূল্য চালাই। এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি নতুন উদ্ধৃতি পরামর্শ মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা কোটারের সকল তিন অংশে পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করে। All the code and data of this paper can be obtained at  https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'bs': 'Vrlo je često koristiti kvotacije (citate) da bi naša pisanja bila elegantnija ili uvjerljivija. Da bi ljudi pomogli da nađu odgovarajuće citate efikasno, predstavlja se zadatak preporuke citata, cilj preporučujući citate koje odgovaraju trenutnom kontekstu pisanja. Postoje različiti pristupi preporukama citata, ali se procjenjuju na različitim nepublicenim podacima. Da bi olakšali istraživanje ovog zadatka, izgradili smo veliku i potpuno otvorenu preporuku za citate podataka po imenu QuoteR, koja sadrži tri dijela uključujući engleski, standardnu kinesku i klasičnu kinesku. Svaki dio toga je veći od prethodnih nepublicenih kolega. Provodimo ogromnu procjenu postojećih metoda preporuke citata o QuoteR-u. Osim toga, predlažemo novi model preporuke citata koji značajno nadmašuje prethodne metode na svim tri dijela quoteR. Svi kod i podaci ovog papira mogu dobiti na https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ca': "És molt comú utilitzar citacions per fer els nostres escriptures més elegants o convincents. Per ajudar la gent a trobar les citacions adequades de manera eficient, es presenta la tasca de recomanació de citacions, mirant a recomanar citacions que encaixin amb el contexte actual de l'escriptura. Hi ha hagut diversos enfocaments de recomanació de citacions, però es valoren en diferents conjunts de dades no publicats. Per facilitar la recerca sobre aquesta tasca, construïm un conjunt de dades de recomendacions de citacions gran i totalment obert anomenat QuoteR, que componen tres parts, incloent l'anglès, el xinès normal i el xinès clàssic. Qualsevol part és més gran que les homologues no publicades anteriors. Fem una extensa evaluació dels mètodes de recomanació existents sobre la QuoteR. A més, proposem un nou model de recomanació que superi significativament els mètodes anteriors en les tres parts de la QuoteR. Tot el codi i les dades d'aquest paper es poden obtenir en https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.", 'id': 'Sangat umum menggunakan kutipan untuk membuat tulisan kita lebih elegan atau meyakinkan. Untuk membantu orang menemukan kutipan yang sesuai secara efisien, tugas kutipan rekomendasi dipaparkan, bertujuan untuk merekomendasikan kutipan yang sesuai dengan konteks tulisan saat ini. Ada berbagai pendekatan rekomendasi kutipan, tapi mereka diuji pada set data yang berbeda yang tidak diterbitkan. Untuk memudahkan penelitian pada tugas ini, kami membangun sebuah set besar dan sepenuhnya terbuka rekomendasi data yang disebut QuoteR, yang mengandung tiga bagian termasuk Inggris, China standar dan China klasik. Any part of it is larger than previous unpublished counterparts.  Kami melakukan evaluasi ekstensif dari metode rekomendasi kutipan yang ada di QuoteR. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan model rekomendasi kutipan baru yang jauh melebihi metode sebelumnya pada semua tiga bagian dari QuoteR. Semua kode dan data kertas ini dapat diperoleh di https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'cs': 'Je velmi běžné používat citace (citace), aby naše spisy byly elegantnější nebo přesvědčivější. Aby lidé pomohli efektivně najít vhodné citace, je prezentován úkol doporučení citace, jehož cílem je doporučit citace, které odpovídají současnému kontextu psaní. Existují různé přístupy k doporučení nabídek, ale jsou hodnoceny na různých nepublikovaných datových sadách. Abychom usnadnili výzkum tohoto úkolu, sestavili jsme velký a plně otevřený datový soubor doporučení nabídek s názvem QuoteR, který se skládá ze tří částí včetně angličtiny, standardní čínštiny a klasické čínštiny. Každá část je větší než předchozí nepublikované protějšky. Provádíme rozsáhlé vyhodnocení stávajících metod doporučení nabídek na QuoteR. Navíc navrhujeme nový model doporučení nabídek, který výrazně překoná předchozí metody na všech třech částech QuoteR. Veškerý kód a data tohoto článku lze získat na adrese https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'et': 'On väga tavaline kasutada tsitaate (tsitaate), et muuta meie kirjutised elegantsemaks või veenevamaks. Et aidata inimestel tõhusalt leida sobivaid tsitaate, esitatakse tsitaatide soovituse ülesanne, mille eesmärk on soovitada tsitaate, mis sobivad praeguse kirjutamise kontekstiga. On olnud erinevaid tsiteerimissoovitusi, kuid neid hinnatakse erinevate avaldamata andmekogumite põhjal. Selle ülesande uurimistöö hõlbustamiseks ehitame suure ja täielikult avatud pakkumissoovituste andmekogumi nimega QuoteR, mis koosneb kolmest osast, sealhulgas inglise, tavapärase hiina ja klassikalise hiina. Iga osa sellest on suurem kui varasemad avaldamata vastaspooled. Hindame põhjalikult olemasolevaid pakkumissoovituste meetodeid QuoteR-is. Lisaks pakume välja uue pakkumissoovituse mudeli, mis ületab oluliselt varasemaid meetodeid kõigis kolmes osas QuoteR. Kõik selle dokumendi koodid ja andmed on kättesaadavad aadressil https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'fi': 'On hyvin yleistä käyttää lainauksia (lainauksia) tehdäkseen kirjoituksistamme tyylikkäämpiä tai vakuuttavampia. Jotta ihmiset löytäisivät sopivia lainauksia tehokkaasti, esitetään lainaussuosituksen tehtävä, jonka tavoitteena on suositella lainauksia, jotka sopivat nykyiseen kirjoittamisen kontekstiin. Lainaussuositusten lähestymistapoja on ollut useita, mutta niitä arvioidaan eri julkaisemattomilla aineistoilla. Tämän tehtävän tutkimuksen helpottamiseksi rakennamme suuren ja täysin avoimen tarjoussuositusaineiston nimeltä QuoteR, joka koostuu kolmesta osasta, mukaan lukien englanti, vakiokiina ja klassinen kiina. Mikä tahansa osa siitä on suurempi kuin aikaisemmat julkaisemattomat vastineet. Teemme laajan arvioinnin olemassa olevista lainaussuositusmenetelmistä QuoteR:ssä. Lisäksi ehdotamme uutta lainaussuositusmallia, joka ylittää merkittävästi aiemmat menetelmät kaikissa kolmessa osassa QuoteR. Kaikki tämän paperin koodi ja tiedot löytyvät osoitteesta https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'sk': 'Zelo pogosto je uporabiti citate (citate), da naredimo naše pisanje elegantnejše ali prepričljivejše. Da bi ljudem pomagali najti ustrezne citate učinkovito, je predstavljena naloga priporočila citatov, katere cilj je priporočiti citate, ki ustrezajo trenutnemu kontekstu pisanja. Obstajajo različni pristopi priporočil za citate, vendar so ocenjeni na različnih neobjavljenih naborih podatkov. Da bi olajšali raziskave o tej nalogi, zgradimo velik in popolnoma odprt nabor podatkov o priporočilih ponudb, imenovan QuoteR, ki obsega tri dele, vključno z angleščino, standardno kitajsko in klasično kitajsko. Kateri koli del je večji od prejšnjih neobjavljenih nasprotnikov. Izvajamo obsežno oceno obstoječih metod priporočil ponudb na QuoteR. Poleg tega predlagamo nov model priporočil ponudb, ki znatno presega prejšnje metode na vseh treh delih QuoteR. Vso kodo in podatke tega prispevka lahko dobite na spletni strani: https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'ha': "Yin amfani da quoten (quoten) don ya sanya rubutunmu mafi fahimta ko mai gaskatãwa. To help people find appropriate quotes efficiently, the task of quote recommendation is presented, aiming to recommend quotes that fit the current context of writing.  An sami masu buƙata masu buƙata masu buƙata, kuma amma an ƙaddara su a kan tsaro daban da ba'a bayyana su ba. Ko iya amfani da fitina kan wannan aikin, muna samar da danne masu buɗa ɗewa mai girma da cikakken buɗaɗewa, sunan QuoteR, wanda ke ƙunsa da sauri uku, kamar harshen Ingiriya, na'ura, na'ura na China da fasalin Kiskuki. Babu wani rabin da ya fi girma daga wasu da ba'a bayyana shi ba. Tuna samar da ƙaddara masu iya ƙayyade shiryoyin ayukan maganar quoter a kan QuoteR. Da haka, muna goyyar da wani misali na shawarar quoter, wanda ke aiki na gabãni kan duk hanyõyi uku na QuoteR. Kuna iya sãmun kodi da data na wannan takardar aiki da https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.", 'he': 'It is very common to use quotations (quotes) to make our writings more elegant or convincing.  כדי לעזור לאנשים למצוא ציטוטים מתאימים באופן יעיל, המשימה של הציטוט המלצה מוצגת, המטרה להמליץ ציטוטים שמתאימים לקונקסט הנוכחי של כתיבה. היו גישות ציטוטיות שונות, אבל הן מוערכות על קבוצות נתונים שונות שלא פורסמות. כדי להקל על המחקר על המשימה הזאת, אנחנו בונים קבוצת מידע גדולה ופתוחה לחלוטין המלצות שנקראת QuoteR, שמכילה שלושה חלקים כולל אנגלית, סינית סטנדרטית וקלאסית קלאסית. כל חלק ממנו גדול יותר משותפים לא פורסמים קודמים. אנו מבצעים עריכה רחבה של שיטות המלצות קיימות על QuoteR. בנוסף, אנו מציעים מודל מצטט חדש שמעביר באופן משמעותי את השיטות הקודמות על כל שלושת חלקי הקוטר. כל הקוד והנתונים של הנייר הזה יכולים להשיג ב https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་འབྲི་ཚིག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐོར་བརྗོད་པར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་མི་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཡིན། To help people find appropriate quotes efficiently, the task of quote recommendation is presented, aiming to recommend quotes that fit the current context of writing. ལྟ་བུ འདིའི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པར་སྤྲོད་ཆེན་བྱས་པར་ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་རྩིས་དང་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་མིང་། འདི་གི་ཆ་ཤས་གང་ཞིག་ཡིན་རུང་མེད་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་ལས་ཆེ་བའི་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གྲོས་གཏོང་གི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་བྱས་ན། དེ་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གསུམ་གྱི་ནང་གི་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་གསང་དང་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཙམ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.', 'jv': 'Ere ngomong nik akeh perusahaan sithik (sithik) dadi bisa ditawakmu akeh pisan langkung apik dadi apik batar. Tulung bantuan ing nggoleki ujaran sing nggawe Perintah punika, dadi nggawe geraraning manunggunian, sing bisa nggunakake sing bisa tukang nggawe ngubah kang kontèks sing bisa stampen. section Ngawe ngejaraké perbudhakan kanggo ranjut ing nggawe iki, kéné nggawe akeh langgar lan buka dataset nggawe "ReplR", sing sumulakno karo telu pating sing tambah Inggris, Chinese padha lan Chinese Normal. Me Awakdhéwé éntuk tanggal ngéwé, ngéwé, éntuk tanggal manunung "ReplyForward" Label ning https://github.com/thunlp/QuoteR.'}
{'en': '"', 'ar': 'نحو تنبؤات شاملة للموافقة على براءات الاختراع: ما وراء التصنيف التقليدي للوثائق', 'fr': "Vers des prévisions complètes d'approbation des brevets\xa0: au-delà de la classification traditionnelle des documents", 'es': 'Hacia predicciones integrales de aprobación de patentes: más allá de la clasificación tradicional de documentos', 'pt': 'Rumo a previsões abrangentes de aprovação de patentes: além da classificação tradicional de documentos', 'ja': '包括的な特許承認予測に向けて：従来の文書分類を超えて', 'ru': 'На пути к всеобъемлющему прогнозированию утверждения патентов:за пределами традиционной классификации документов', 'zh': '总占专利:越旧文献', 'hi': 'व्यापक पेटेंट अनुमोदन भविष्यवाणियों की ओर: पारंपरिक दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण से परे', 'ga': 'I dTreo Réamh-mheastacháin Chuimsitheach Faofa Paitinne: Thar Aicmiú Doiciméad Traidisiúnta', 'ka': 'ყველაფერი პოტენტის მიღება:ტრადიციონალური დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის გარეშე', 'el': 'Προς τις περιεκτικές προβλέψεις έγκρισης διπλωμάτων ευρεσιτεχνίας: Πέρα από την παραδοσιακή ταξινόμηση εγγράφων', 'hu': 'Az átfogó szabadalmi jóváhagyási előrejelzések felé: a hagyományos dokumentumok osztályozásán túl', 'it': 'Verso previsioni complete di approvazione dei brevetti: oltre la classificazione tradizionale dei documenti', 'kk': 'Тәуелді патенттерді қабылдау үшін:Дәстүрлі құжат классификациясының артында', 'lt': 'Išsamių patentų patvirtinimo prognozių link: be tradicinių dokumentų klasifikavimo', 'mk': 'Напред традиционалната класификација на документот', 'ms': 'Ke arah Prediksi Pengesahan Paten Komprensif:Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'ml': 'Towards Comprehensive Patent Approval Predictions:Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'mt': 'Lejn Previżjonijiet Komprensivi tal-Approvazzjoni tal-Privattivi:Lil hinn mill-Klassifikazzjoni tad-Dokument Tradizzjonali', 'mn': 'Дээрээсэн patent Approval Predictions руу:Traditional Document Classification Outside', 'no': 'Towards Comprehensive Patent Approval Predictions:Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'pl': 'W kierunku kompleksowych prognoz zatwierdzania patentów:poza tradycyjną klasyfikacją dokumentów', 'ro': 'Către predicții cuprinzătoare de aprobare a brevetelor: Dincolo de clasificarea tradițională a documentelor', 'sr': 'Predviđanja za odobrenje patenata:Izvan klasifikacije tradicionalnog dokumenta', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලට:', 'so': 'Horumarinta kaalmada waalidka:Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'sv': 'Mot omfattande prognoser för patentgodkännande: bortom traditionell dokumentklassificering', 'ta': 'மேல் முழுமையான பாதையின் முன்னுரிமைகள்:Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'ur': 'ہر طرح کے پیٹینٹ منتخب کی پیشنهاد کی طرف:', 'uz': 'Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'vi': 'Hướng tới định giá giấy phép tổng quát:', 'bg': 'Към цялостни прогнози за одобрението на патенти: отвъд традиционната класификация на документите', 'da': 'På vej mod omfattende forudsigelser for patentgodkendelse: Ud over traditionel dokumentklassificering', 'hr': 'Predviđanja o potpunom odobrenju patenata:Izvan klasifikacije tradicionalnog dokumenta', 'nl': 'Naar alomvattende voorspellingen voor octrooigemachtiging:verder dan traditionele documentclassificatie', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu umfassenden Vorhersagen über die Patentzulassung:Über die herkömmliche Dokumentenklassifizierung hinaus', 'ko': '전면적인 특허 비준 예측 실현: 전통적인 문헌 분류를 초월하다', 'id': 'Menuju Prediksi Pengesahan Paten Komprensif:Melalui Klasifikasi Dokumen Tradisional', 'fa': 'به عنوان پیشنهاد تصمیم پذیرفته\u200cهای کامل:بیرون کلاس\u200cشناسایی سنتی', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Sheria ya Taifa', 'sq': 'Përtej klasifikimit tradicional të dokumentit', 'tr': 'Däpli Sened Klassifikasi', 'af': 'Na komprehensiewe patente-toestemmingsvoorwaardes:buite tradisionele dokumentklassifikasie', 'am': 'Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'hy': 'Towards Comprehensive Patent Approval Predictions:Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'az': 'Tüm Patent Approval Predictions: Traditional Document Classification Beyond', 'bn': 'উপরের সম্পূর্ণ প্যাটেন্টের প্রিয় পছন্দ:', 'bs': 'Predviđanja o potpunom odobrenju patenata:Izvan klasifikacije tradicionalnog dokumenta', 'cs': 'K komplexním predikcím schválení patentů: kromě klasifikace tradičních dokumentů', 'et': 'Põhjalike patendi heakskiitmise prognooside suunas: kaugemale traditsioonilisest dokumentide klassifitseerimisest', 'fi': 'Kohti kattavia patenttien hyväksymisennusteita: Perinteisen asiakirjojen luokittelun lisäksi', 'ca': 'Towards Comprehensive Patent Approval Predictions:Beyond Traditional Document Classification', 'he': 'לכיוון טיפוסי אישור פלנטים מורכבים:מעבר לסיפור מסמכים מסורתיים', 'ha': 'Beyond Tratraditional Document Classification', 'jv': 'Learn Traditional document', 'sk': 'Za celovite napovedi odobritve patentov: nad klasifikacijo dokumentov', 'bo': 'འོད་ཀྱང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་ལྕགས་ཅན་ཞིབ་འཇུག་གི་སྲོལ་རྗེས།Beyond Traditional Document Classification'}
{'en': 'Hedges have an important role in the management of rapport. In peer-tutoring, they are notably used by tutors in dyads experiencing low rapport to tone down the impact of instructions and negative feedback.Pursuing the objective of building a tutoring agent that manages rapport with teenagers in order to improve learning, we used a multimodal peer-tutoring dataset to construct a computational framework for identifying hedges. We compared approaches relying on pre-trained resources with others that integrate insights from the social science literature. Our best performance involved a hybrid approach that outperforms the existing baseline while being easier to interpret. We employ a model explainability tool to explore the features that characterize hedges in peer-tutoring conversations, and we identify some novel features, and the benefits of a such a hybrid model approach.', 'ar': 'يعد توقع فرصة الموافقة على طلب براءة اختراع مشكلة صعبة تنطوي على جوانب متعددة. يمكن القول إن الجانب الأكثر أهمية هو الحداثة --- \\ emph {35 U.S. Code § 102} التي ترفض التطبيقات الأحدث التي لها فنون سابقة متشابهة جدًا. تختلف تقييمات الجدة هذه في توقع الموافقة على براءة الاختراع عن تصنيف المستندات التقليدي - قد تشترك طلبات البراءات الناجحة في أنماط كتابة مماثلة ؛ ومع ذلك ، فإن التطبيقات الأحدث المتشابهة جدًا ستتلقى التسمية المعاكسة ، مما يؤدي إلى إرباك مصنفات المستندات القياسية (على سبيل المثال ، BERT). لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح إطار عمل جديدًا يوحد مصنف المستندات بميزات مصنوعة يدويًا ، لا سيما درجات الجدة المعتمدة على الوقت. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم بصياغة درجات الجدة من خلال مقارنة كل تطبيق بملايين الفنون السابقة باستخدام مزيج من المرشحات الفعالة والتشفير الثنائي العصبي. علاوة على ذلك ، فإننا نفرض مصطلح تسوية جديدًا على هدف التصنيف لفرض التغيير الرتيب لتوقع الموافقة w.r.t. عشرات الجدة. من التجارب المكثفة على مجموعة بيانات USPTO واسعة النطاق ، وجدنا أن ضبط BERT القياسي يمكن أن يتعلم جزئيًا العلاقة الصحيحة بين الجدة والموافقات من البيانات غير المتسقة. ومع ذلك ، فإن ميزاتنا الجديدة التي تعتمد على الوقت تقدم دفعة قوية فوقها. أيضًا ، يمكن أن يؤدي التنظيم الرتيب الخاص بنا ، مع تقليص مساحة البحث ، إلى دفع المُحسِّن إلى تحسين محلي أفضل ، مما يؤدي إلى زيادة صغيرة في الأداء.', 'es': 'Predecir la posibilidad de aprobación de una solicitud de patente es un problema desafiante que implica múltiples facetas. Podría decirse que la faceta más importante es la novedad:\\ emph {35 Código de los Estados Unidos § 102} rechaza las solicitudes más recientes que tienen técnicas anteriores muy similares. Estas evaluaciones de novedad difieren de la predicción de aprobación de patentes de la clasificación de documentos convencional. Las solicitudes de patente exitosas pueden compartir patrones de escritura similares; sin embargo, las solicitudes más nuevas demasiado similares recibirían la etiqueta opuesta, lo que confundía a los clasificadores de documentos estándar (por ejemplo, BERT). Para abordar este problema, proponemos un marco novedoso que unifica el clasificador de documentos con características artesanales, en particular puntuaciones de novedad dependientes del tiempo. Específicamente, formulamos las puntuaciones de novedad comparando cada aplicación con millones de técnicas anteriores utilizando un híbrido de filtros eficientes y un bi-codificador neuronal. Además, imponemos un nuevo término de regularización en el objetivo de clasificación para hacer cumplir el cambio monótono de la predicción de aprobación con respecto a las puntuaciones de novedad. A partir de extensos experimentos realizados en un conjunto de datos de la USPTO a gran escala, descubrimos que el ajuste fino del BERT estándar puede aprender parcialmente la relación correcta entre novedad y aprobaciones a partir de datos inconsistentes. Sin embargo, nuestras funciones novedosas que dependen del tiempo ofrecen un impulso adicional. Además, nuestra regularización monótona, al tiempo que reduce el espacio de búsqueda, puede llevar al optimizador a un mejor óptimo local, lo que produce una pequeña ganancia de rendimiento adicional.', 'fr': "Prédire les chances d'approbation d'une demande de brevet est un problème complexe qui comporte de multiples facettes. L'aspect le plus crucial est sans doute la nouveauté —\xa0\\ emph {35 U.S. Code § 102} rejette les demandes plus récentes qui présentent des antériorités très similaires. Ces évaluations de la nouveauté diffèrent de la prédiction de l'approbation d'un brevet par rapport au classement classique des documents — les demandes de brevet retenues peuvent présenter des schémas d'écriture similaires\xa0; cependant, des demandes plus récentes trop similaires recevraient l'étiquette opposée, ce qui créerait de la confusion chez les classificateurs de documents standard (par exemple, BERT). Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un nouveau cadre qui unifie le classificateur de documents avec des fonctionnalités artisanales, en particulier des scores de nouveauté dépendant du temps. Plus précisément, nous formulons les scores de nouveauté en comparant chaque application avec des millions d'antériorités à l'aide d'un hybride de filtres efficaces et d'un biencodeur neuronal. De plus, nous imposons un nouveau terme de régularisation dans l'objectif de classification pour appliquer la prédiction monotone de changement d'approbation par rapport aux scores de nouveauté. À partir d'expériences approfondies sur un ensemble de données à grande échelle de l'USPTO, nous avons constaté que le réglage fin du BERT standard peut partiellement apprendre la relation correcte entre la nouveauté et les approbations à partir de données in Cependant, nos fonctionnalités de nouveauté dépendant du temps offrent un coup de pouce en plus. De plus, notre régularisation monotone, tout en réduisant l'espace de recherche, peut conduire l'optimiseur à une meilleure optimisation locale, ce qui entraîne un petit gain de performance supplémentaire.", 'pt': 'Prever a chance de aprovação de um pedido de patente é um problema desafiador que envolve múltiplas facetas. A faceta mais crucial é, sem dúvida, a novidade --- \\emph{35 U.S. Code § 102} rejeita aplicações mais recentes que têm artes anteriores muito semelhantes. Essas avaliações de novidade diferem a previsão de aprovação de patente da classificação de documento convencional --- Pedidos de patente bem-sucedidos podem compartilhar padrões de escrita semelhantes; no entanto, aplicativos mais recentes muito semelhantes receberiam o rótulo oposto, confundindo assim os classificadores de documentos padrão (por exemplo, BERT). Para resolver esse problema, propomos um novo framework que unifica o classificador de documentos com recursos artesanais, particularmente pontuações de novidade dependentes do tempo. Especificamente, formulamos as pontuações de novidade comparando cada aplicação com milhões de técnicas anteriores usando um híbrido de filtros eficientes e um bi-codificador neural. Além disso, impomos um novo prazo de regularização no objetivo de classificação para impor a mudança monotônica da previsão de aprovação w.r.t. pontuações de novidade. A partir de extensos experimentos em um conjunto de dados USPTO em grande escala, descobrimos que o ajuste fino padrão do BERT pode aprender parcialmente a relação correta entre novidade e aprovações de dados inconsistentes. No entanto, nossos recursos de novidade dependentes do tempo oferecem um impulso em cima disso. Além disso, nossa regularização monotônica, enquanto reduz o espaço de busca, pode levar o otimizador a melhores ótimos locais, gerando um ganho de desempenho ainda menor.', 'ja': '特許出願の承認機会を予測することは、複数の側面に関わる困難な問題である。 最も重要な側面は、非常に類似した先行技術を有する最近の出願を拒否する新規性であると言える。 このような新規性の評価は、従来の文書分類と特許承認予測を異にする---成功した特許出願は、同様の書き込みパターンを共有し得るが、あまりにも類似した新しい出願は、反対のラベルを受け取るため、標準的な文書分類子（例えば、BERT ）を混乱させる。 この問題に対処するために、文書分類子を手作業で作成された特徴、特に時間に依存した新規性スコアで統一する新規フレームワークを提案します。 具体的には、効率的なフィルタとニューラルバイエンコーダのハイブリッドを使用して、各アプリケーションを数百万の先行技術と比較することによって、新規性スコアを策定する。 さらに、我々は、承認予測の単調な変化を新規性スコアで強制するために、新しい規則化項を分類目標に課します。 大規模なUSPTOデータセットの広範な実験から、標準的なBERT微調整は、一貫性のないデータから新規性と承認の間の正しい関係を部分的に学ぶことができることがわかりました。 しかし、時間に依存した新機能は、それに加えてブーストを提供します。 また、単調な正規化は、検索スペースを縮小しながら、最適化をより良いローカル最適化に駆り立て、さらなる小さなパフォーマンスの向上をもたらすことができます。', 'hi': 'पेटेंट आवेदन के अनुमोदन की संभावना की भविष्यवाणी करना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या है जिसमें कई पहलू शामिल हैं। सबसे महत्वपूर्ण पहलू यकीनन नवीनता है --- \\emph{35 U.S. Code § 102} अधिक हाल के अनुप्रयोगों को अस्वीकार करता है जिनमें बहुत समान पूर्व कलाएं हैं। इस तरह की नवीनता मूल्यांकन पारंपरिक दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण से पेटेंट अनुमोदन की भविष्यवाणी को अलग करते हैं --- सफल पेटेंट अनुप्रयोग समान लेखन पैटर्न साझा कर सकते हैं; हालांकि, बहुत समान नए अनुप्रयोगों को विपरीत लेबल प्राप्त होगा, इस प्रकार मानक दस्तावेज़ क्लासिफायर (जैसे, BERT) को भ्रमित करेगा। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं \\ हमारा जो दस्तावेज़ क्लासिफायर को हस्तनिर्मित सुविधाओं, विशेष रूप से समय-निर्भर नवीनता स्कोर के साथ एकीकृत करता है। विशेष रूप से, हम कुशल फिल्टर और एक तंत्रिका द्वि-एन्कोडर के हाइब्रिड का उपयोग करके लाखों पूर्व कलाओं के साथ प्रत्येक एप्लिकेशन की तुलना करके नवीनता स्कोर तैयार करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम वर्गीकरण उद्देश्य में एक नया नियमितीकरण शब्द लागू करने के लिए अनुमोदन भविष्यवाणी w.r.t. नवीनता स्कोर के monotonic परिवर्तन को लागू करने के लिए. एक बड़े पैमाने पर यूएसपीटीओ डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से, हम पाते हैं कि मानक BERT ठीक ट्यूनिंग आंशिक रूप से असंगत डेटा से नवीनता और अनुमोदन के बीच सही संबंध सीख सकते हैं। हालांकि, हमारी समय-निर्भर नवीनता विशेषताएं इसके शीर्ष पर एक बढ़ावा देती हैं। इसके अलावा, हमारे मोनोटोनिक नियमितीकरण, जबकि खोज स्थान को कम करते हुए, ऑप्टिमाइज़र को बेहतर स्थानीय ऑप्टिमा के लिए ड्राइव कर सकते हैं, जिससे एक और छोटा प्रदर्शन लाभ प्राप्त हो सकता है।', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование вероятности утверждения патентной заявки является сложной проблемой, связанной с несколькими аспектами. Наиболее важным аспектом, возможно, является новизна --- \\emph{35 Кодекс США § 102} отклоняет более недавние заявки, которые имеют очень похожие предшествующие уровни техники. Такие оценки новизны отличаются от предсказания утверждения патента классификацией обычных документов --- Успешные патентные заявки могут иметь схожие шаблоны написания; однако, слишком похожие новые заявки получат противоположную метку, тем самым вводя в заблуждение стандартные классификаторы документов (например, BERT). Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем новую структуру, которая объединяет классификатор документов с функциями ручной работы, в частности, баллами новизны, зависящими от времени. В частности, мы формулируем баллы новизны, сравнивая каждое приложение с миллионами предшествующих уровней техники с использованием гибрида эффективных фильтров и нейронного бикодера. Кроме того, мы вводим новый термин регуляризации в цель классификации для обеспечения монотонного изменения прогноза одобрения с оценками новизны w.r.t. Из обширных экспериментов на крупномасштабном наборе данных USPTO мы обнаружили, что стандартная точная настройка BERT может частично изучить правильную связь между новизной и разрешениями на основе противоречивых данных. Однако, наши зависящие от времени новизны функции предлагают усиление сверху. Кроме того, наша монотонная регуляризация, в то же время уменьшая пространство поиска, может привести оптимизатор к лучшей локальной оптимизации, давая дополнительный небольшой прирост производительности.', 'zh': '占专利申请者,数挑战性也。 至要可谓新颖性---\\emph{35 U.S. Code § 102}拒相似之最新。 此新颖性评估使专利准测与旧文分类不同,---成功者专利申请或有相似之式。 然过相似者应用程序将得其标,以乱其法文档分类器(如BERT)。 为此一新框架,文档类器与工(特赖新奇)一也。 具体来说以高效过滤器神经双编码器合之,各以数百万种术较新颖性分数。 此外,我们在分类中强加了一个新正则化术语,以强制执行准测w.r.t.新颖性分数的单调。 大USPTO广实验,BERT调以知新颖性允之正。 然吾辈赖时新奇功能以资升擢。 此外单调正则化在缩小搜索空间,可驱优化器得局最优,更得小者性升擢。', 'ga': 'Fadhb dhúshlánach a bhaineann le gnéithe iolracha is ea an seans formheasta maidir le hiarratas ar phaitinn a thuar. D’fhéadfaí a áitiú gurb é an ghné is tábhachtaí ná an t-úrscéal --- \\emph{35 US Code § 102} a dhiúltóidh d’fheidhmchláir níos deireanaí a bhfuil ealaíona an-chosúil acu roimhe seo. Ní hionann meastóireachtaí nuachta den sórt sin idir an réamh-mheastachán um fhormheas paitinne agus gnáthaicmiú doiciméad --- Féadfaidh iarratais ar phaitinn rathúla patrúin scríbhneoireachta comhchosúla a roinnt; áfach, gheobhadh iarratais níos nuaí atá róchosúil leis an lipéad eile, rud a chuirfeadh mearbhall ar aicmitheoirí caighdeánacha doiciméad (m.sh., BERT). Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid creat nua \\our a aontóidh an t-aicmitheoir doiciméad le gnéithe lámhdhéanta, go háirithe scóir nuachta a bhraitheann ar am. Go sonrach, foirmímid na scóir nuachta trí gach feidhmchlár a chur i gcomparáid leis na milliúin ealaíon roimhe seo ag baint úsáide as hibrideach de scagairí éifeachtacha agus dé-ionchódóra néaraigh. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid téarma nua um rialáil i bhfeidhm ar an gcuspóir aicmithe chun an t-athrú monotonach ar thuar formheasa w.r.t. scóir nuachta. Ó thurgnaimh fhairsing ar thacar sonraí USPTO ar mhórscála, feicimid gur féidir le mionchoigeartú caighdeánach BERT an gaol ceart idir úrnuacht agus formheasanna a fhoghlaim go páirteach ó shonraí neamhréireacha. Mar sin féin, cuireann ár ngnéithe nuachta atá ag brath ar am le borradh sa bhreis air. Chomh maith leis sin, is féidir lenár rialáil monotonach, agus an spás cuardaigh á chrapadh, an t-uasmhéadaitheoir a thiomáint chuig barrmhaitheas áitiúil níos fearr, rud a thugann gnóthachan feidhmíochta beag eile.', 'el': 'Η πρόβλεψη της πιθανότητας έγκρισης μιας αίτησης ευρεσιτεχνίας είναι ένα δύσκολο πρόβλημα που περιλαμβάνει πολλαπλές πτυχές. Η πιο κρίσιμη πτυχή είναι αναμφίβολα η καινοτομία -απορρίπτει πιο πρόσφατες αιτήσεις που έχουν πολύ παρόμοια προϋπάρχουσα τέχνες. Τέτοιες αξιολογήσεις καινοτομίας διαφέρουν την πρόβλεψη έγκρισης διπλωμάτων ευρεσιτεχνίας από τη συμβατική ταξινόμηση εγγράφων--- Οι επιτυχείς αιτήσεις διπλωμάτων ευρεσιτεχνίας μπορούν να έχουν παρόμοια πρότυπα γραφής. Ωστόσο, οι πολύ παρόμοιες νεότερες εφαρμογές θα λαμβάνουν την αντίθετη ετικέτα, προκαλώντας σύγχυση με τους τυποποιημένους ταξινομητές εγγράφων (π.χ. BERT). Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο που ενοποιεί τον ταξινομητή εγγράφων με χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά, ιδιαίτερα χρονοεξαρτώμενες βαθμολογίες καινοτομίας. Συγκεκριμένα, διαμορφώνουμε τις βαθμολογίες καινοτομίας συγκρίνοντας κάθε εφαρμογή με εκατομμύρια προηγούμενες τέχνες χρησιμοποιώντας ένα υβρίδιο αποτελεσματικών φίλτρων και έναν νευρικό δικωδικοποιητή. Επιπλέον, επιβάλλεται ένας νέος όρος νομιμοποίησης στον στόχο ταξινόμησης για την επιβολή της μονοτονικής αλλαγής της πρόβλεψης έγκρισης χωρίς βαθμολογίες καινοτομίας. Από εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων μεγάλης κλίμακας διαπιστώνουμε ότι ο τυπικός συντονισμός μπορεί εν μέρει να μάθει τη σωστή σχέση μεταξύ καινοτομίας και εγκρίσεων από ασυνεπή δεδομένα. Ωστόσο, τα χρονοεξαρτώμενα χαρακτηριστικά καινοτομίας μας προσφέρουν μια ώθηση πάνω από αυτό. Επίσης, η μονοτονική ρύθμιση μας, ενώ συρρικνώνει το χώρο αναζήτησης, μπορεί να οδηγήσει τον βελτιστοποιητή σε καλύτερο τοπικό βέλτιστο, δίνοντας ένα ακόμη μικρό κέρδος απόδοσης.', 'hu': 'A szabadalmi bejelentés jóváhagyási esélyének előrejelzése több szempontból is kihívást jelent. A legfontosabb aspektus vitathatóan az újdonság -- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} elutasítja a legújabb alkalmazásokat, amelyek nagyon hasonló korábbi művészetekkel rendelkeznek. Az ilyen újdonsági értékelések eltérnek a szabadalmi jóváhagyás előrejelzésétől a hagyományos dokumentumok osztályozásától --- A sikeres szabadalmi bejelentések hasonló írási mintákat használhatnak; A túlságosan hasonló újabb alkalmazások azonban az ellenkező címkét kapnák, ami összezavarja a szabványos dokumentumok osztályozóit (pl. BERT). Ennek a kérdésnek a megoldására egy új keretrendszert javasolunk, amely egyesíti a dokumentumok osztályozóját kézzel készített funkciókkal, különösen az időfüggő újdonságokkal. Konkrétan az újdonsági pontszámokat úgy alakítjuk ki, hogy összehasonlítjuk az egyes alkalmazásokat több millió korábbi művészettel, hatékony szűrők és egy neurális bi-kódoló hibridje segítségével. Továbbá új szabályozási kifejezést vezetünk be az osztályozási célba, hogy érvényesítsük a jóváhagyási előrejelzés monoton változását az újdonsági pontszámokkal. Egy nagyszabású USPTO adatkészleten végzett kiterjedt kísérletekből kiderül, hogy a szabványos BERT finomhangolás részben az újdonság és a jóváhagyások közötti helyes kapcsolatot következetlen adatokból tudja megtanulni. Azonban időfüggő újdonsági funkcióink a tetején is lendületet nyújtanak. Ezenkívül monoton szabályozásunk, miközben csökkenti a keresési területet, az optimalizálót jobb helyi optimára vezetheti, ami további kis teljesítménynövekedést eredményez.', 'ka': 'პოტენტის პროგრამის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობა არის მრავალ ფექციების შესაძლებლობელი პრობლემა. უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ფექტი არის ახალგაზრულობა --- \\emph{35 U.S. კოდის 102} უფრო ახალგაზრული პროგრამები, რომლებიც ძალიან მსგავსი წინასწორები აქვს. ასეთი ახალგაზრულების განსაზღვრება განსხვავებულია პოტენტის განსაზღვრება კონტანციონალური დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციაზე --- წარმატებული პოტენტის პროგრამე მაგრამ ძალიან მსგავსი ახალი პროგრამები მიღებენ განსაკუთრებული ლაბელის, ამიტომ შეცდომა სტანდარტული დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციები (მაგალითად BERT ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პრობლემა, რომელიც კლასიფიკაცია დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციას პრობლემენტებით, განსაკუთრებით დროის განსაკ განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ახალგაზრულების წერტილების ფორმატირებით, ყველა პროგრამის მილიონი წერტილების შემდეგ გამოყენებით ეფექტიური ფილტრილების ჰიბრიდის და ნეიროლური ბიკო დამატებით, ჩვენ ახალი რეგილარიზაციის ტემინს კლასიფიკაციის მიზეზაში დავყენებთ, რომ მონოტონიური ცვლილების მონიშნული წინასწორების წინასწორების წინასწორების შეცვლა. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტებიდან დიდი მაგალითი USPTO მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაზე, ჩვენ ვიღებთ, რომ სტანდარტული BERT კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის ნაწილად შეიძლება ნასწავლა მაგრამ, ჩვენი დროის შესახებ ახალგაზრულებების შესახებ მას უფრო მეტია. ჩვენი მონოტონიური რეგილარიზაცია, როცა საძიებო სივრცე შემცირებულია, შეიძლება ოპტიმიზაციას უფრო მეტი ლოკალური ოპტიმაზე გაკავება, როცა უფრო მეტი პატარ', 'mk': 'Предвидувањето на шансата за одобрување на апликацијата за патент е предизвикувачки проблем кој вклучува повеќе аспекти. Најклучниот факт е најверојатно новоста --- \\emph{35 американски код 102} отфрла понатамошни апликации кои имаат многу слични претходни уметности. Such novelty evaluations differ the patent approval prediction from conventional document classification --- Successful patent applications may share similar writing patterns;  сепак, премногу слични нови апликации ќе ја добијат спротивната етикета, со што ќе се збунат стандардните класификатори на документи (на пример, БЕРТ). To address this issue, we propose a novel framework \\our that unifies the document classifier with handcrafted features, particularly time-dependent novelty scores.  Специфично, ги формулираме новите резултати споредувајќи ја секоја апликација со милиони претходни уметности користејќи хибрид на ефикасни филтри и нервен бикодер. Moreover, we impose a new regularization term into the classification objective to enforce the monotonic change of approval prediction w.r.t. novelty scores.  Од експериментите на голем степен на USPTO податоци, откриваме дека стандардното BERT финетизирање може делумно да ја научи вистинската врска помеѓу новоста и одобрувањата од несогласни податоци. Сепак, нашите времето зависни новости нудат поттик над тоа. Also, our monotonic regularization, while shrinking the search space, can drive the optimizer to better local optima, yielding a further small performance gain.', 'it': "Prevedere la possibilità di approvazione di una domanda di brevetto è un problema impegnativo che coinvolge molteplici aspetti. L'aspetto più cruciale è probabilmente la novità -- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} respinge applicazioni più recenti che hanno arti precedenti molto simili. Tali valutazioni di novità differiscono la previsione di approvazione del brevetto dalla classificazione convenzionale dei documenti --- Le domande di brevetto di successo possono condividere modelli di scrittura simili; Tuttavia, le nuove applicazioni troppo simili riceverebbero l'etichetta opposta, confondendo così i classificatori standard di documenti (ad esempio BERT). Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un nuovo framework \\nostro che unifica il classificatore di documenti con caratteristiche artigianali, in particolare punteggi di novità dipendenti dal tempo. Nello specifico, formuliamo i punteggi di novità confrontando ogni applicazione con milioni di arti precedenti utilizzando un ibrido di filtri efficienti e un bi-encoder neurale. Inoltre, imponiamo un nuovo termine di regolarizzazione nell'obiettivo di classificazione per far rispettare il cambiamento monotonico della previsione di approvazione w.r.t. novelty scores. Da esperimenti approfonditi su un set di dati USPTO su larga scala, scopriamo che la messa a punto standard BERT può in parte imparare la corretta relazione tra novità e approvazioni da dati incoerenti. Tuttavia, le nostre funzionalità di novità dipendenti dal tempo offrono una spinta in più. Inoltre, la nostra regolarizzazione monotonica, pur riducendo lo spazio di ricerca, può guidare l'ottimizzatore verso un migliore optima locale, producendo un ulteriore piccolo guadagno di prestazioni.", 'kk': 'Патенттік қолданбаны қабылдау мүмкіндігін таңдау - бірнеше мәселелерді қамтамасыз. Ең маңызды мәлімет - жаңалық мәлімет -\\ emph{35 U.S. код 102} деген жаңа жаңа қолданбаларды алдындағы өте ұқсас әртүрлерді қабылдайды. Бұл жаңалық оқиғалар патенттердің оқиғаларының кәдімгі құжаттардың классификациясынан бағдарламасын айырмашылып тұрады --- Сәтті патенттердің қолданбалары ұ Бірақ жаңа жаңа қолданбалар қарсы жарлықты қабылдайды, сондықтан стандартты құжатты классификациялары (мысалы, BERT). Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін, біз жаңа фрейм қолданып құжатты классификациясын қол құрылған мүмкіндіктерімен біріктіретін, осылақ уақытта тәуелді жаңа нәтижелерімен біріктірет Ескерту үшін, әрбір қолданбаны миллиондар алдыңғы суреттермен қалыптастырып, әрбір ньюралық екі кодерлерді гибрид сүзгілерді және ньюралық сүзгілерді қолдануға болады. Сонымен қатар, біз жаңа қадамдастыру терминін классификациялау мақсатына қолдану үшін, міндетті жаңа қадамдастыру үшін, міндетті қадамдастыру нәтижесін қолдануға болады. USPTO деректер қорларының үлкен масштабынан кеңейтілген тәжірибелерден біз стандартты BERT баптауының жалғыз мәліметтерінің жалғыз қатынасын оқуға болады. Бірақ, уақыт тәуелді жаңа қасиеттеріміз оның үстінен көтеріп жатыр. Сонымен қатар, іздеу кеңістігін азайтып, монотонны қадамдастыру, оптимизаторды жергілікті оптимаға жақсы көтеруге болады. Кішкене шағын істеу үшін көтеруге болады.', 'ms': 'Memandangkan peluang persetujuan aplikasi paten adalah masalah mencabar yang melibatkan berbagai sisi. The most crucial facet is arguably the novelty --- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} rejects more recent applications that have very similar prior arts.  Such novelty evaluations differ the patent approval prediction from conventional document classification --- Successful patent applications may share similar writing patterns;  bagaimanapun, aplikasi yang lebih baru terlalu serupa akan menerima label bertentangan, jadi mengelirukan pengklasifikasi dokumen piawai (cth., BERT). Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami melamar kerangka baru \\kami yang menyatukan pengklasifikasi dokumen dengan ciri-ciri buatan tangan, terutama skor baru bergantung pada masa. Specifically, we formulate the novelty scores by comparing each application with millions of prior arts using a hybrid of efficient filters and a neural bi-encoder.  Selain itu, kita memaksa istilah pengaturan baru ke dalam objektif klasifikasi untuk memaksa perubahan monotonik ramalan persetujuan w.r.t. skor baru. Dari eksperimen ekstensif pada set data USPTO skala besar, kami mendapati bahawa penyesuaian BERT piawai boleh sebahagian belajar hubungan yang betul antara baru dan persetujuan dari data yang tidak konsisten. Bagaimanapun, ciri-ciri baru bergantung pada masa kami menawarkan bantuan di atasnya. Also, our monotonic regularization, while shrinking the search space, can drive the optimizer to better local optima, yielding a further small performance gain.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പാറ്റെന്റ് പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ അനുവാദം സ്വീകരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് പല മുഖങ്ങളുടെയും ചാല്\u200dവെല്ലുകള ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മുഖത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d നോവലിയാണെന്നാണ് വാദിക്കുന്നത്--{35 അമേരിക്കന്\u200d കോഡ് 102} മുമ്പുള്ള കലാകൃത്യങ്ങള്\u200d ക ഇതുപോലുള്ള നോവലിയുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ രേഖയുടെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനില്\u200d നിന്നും പാറ്റെന്റിന്റെ അനുവാദം വ്യത്യസ്തമാകുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഇതുപോലെയുള്ള പുതിയ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പിലുള്ള ലേബറില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകും, അതുകൊണ്ട് സാധാരണ രേഖകള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d വ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. രേഖകള്\u200d കൈകൊണ്ട് കൈകൊണ്ടുള് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, എല്ലാ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മുമ്പുള്ള കലാകൃത്രങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം തുല്യമാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നോവലിറ്റിയുടെ സ്കോര്\u200dസ് രൂപപ് അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ നിയന്ത്രണ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലേക്ക് നിര്\u200dബന്ധിക്കുന്നു. പ്രവചനത്തിന്റെ മാറ്റം മാറ്റ ഒരു വലിയ യ USPTO ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമുക്ക് കണ്ടെത്താം, സാധാരണ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഫൈന്\u200d ടൌണിങ്ങ് ഭാഗമായി നോവലിയ എന്നാലും, നമ്മുടെ സമയത്തിന്\u200dറെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന നോവലിന്\u200dറെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d അതിന്\u200dറെ മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പ്രേബദ് നമ്മുടെ മോണോട്ടോണിക്ക് നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ നിയന്ത്രണം, തെരച്ചില്\u200d സ്പെയിസ്റ്റ് കുറുക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, സ്ഥാനമായ സ്ഥാനത്തില', 'mt': 'Il-previżjoni taċ-ċans tal-approvazzjoni ta’ applikazzjoni għall-privattiva hija problem a ta’ sfida li tinvolvi diversi aspetti. L-aspett l-aktar kruċjali huwa probabbilment il-ġdid --- \\emph{35 Kodiċi tal-Istati Uniti 102} jirrifjuta applikazzjonijiet aktar riċenti li għandhom arti preċedenti simili ħafna. Such novelty evaluations differ the patent approval prediction from conventional document classification --- Successful patent applications may share similar writing patterns;  madankollu, applikazzjonijiet ġodda simili wisq jirċievu t-tikketta opposta, u b’hekk iwasslu g ħall-konfużjoni tal-klassifikaturi standard tad-dokumenti (pereżempju BERT). Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nipproponu qafas ġdid tagħna li jgħaqqad il-klassifikatur tad-dokumenti mal-karatteristiċi maħduma bl-idejn, partikolarment punteġġi ta’ innovazzjoni dipendenti fuq iż-żmien. Speċifikament, a ħna nifformulaw il-punteġġi tal-innovazzjoni billi nqabblu kull applikazzjoni ma’ miljuni ta’ arti preċedenti bl-użu ta’ ibridu ta’ filtri effiċjenti u bi-kodifikatur newrali. Barra minn hekk, nimponu terminu ġdid t a’ regolarizzazzjoni fl-għan tal-klassifikazzjoni biex ninfurzaw il-bidla monotonika t a t-tbassir tal-approvazzjoni b’mod partikolari punteġġi ġodda. From extensive experiments on a large-scale USPTO dataset, we find that standard BERT fine-tuning can partially learn the correct relationship between novelty and approvals from inconsistent data.  However, our time-dependent novelty features offer a boost on top of it.  Also, our monotonic regularization, while shrinking the search space, can drive the optimizer to better local optima, yielding a further small performance gain.', 'mn': 'Патент хэрэглээ зөвшөөрөх боломжтой байх нь олон нүүрстөрөгчийн тухай хэцүү асуудал юм. Хамгийн чухал нүүр нь шинэ зүйл гэсэн үг--- \\emph{35.U.S. кодекс 102} өмнөх урлагийн ижил ижил төстэй хэрэгслүүдийг эсрэг байдаг. Ийм шинэ дүгнэлт нь энгийн баримт хуваалцааны патент одоогийн таамаглалтыг өөрчлөгдөж байна--- Амжилттай патент програм нь ижил бичих загваруудыг хуваалцаж болно. Гэхдээ хэтэрхий шинэ програм нь эсрэг загварыг авах болно. Тиймээс стандарт баримт хуваалцагчид (жишээ нь BERT). Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд бид шинэ хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Бид баримтыг гар бүтээгдэхүүнтэй нэгтгэдэг. Ялангуяа цаг хугацааны хамааралтай шинэ оноо. Ялангуяа бид хэрэглээ бүр сая сая өмнөх урлагтай харьцуулахад шинэ оноо тооцоолж, бүтээмжтэй сүзгүүдийн гибрид болон мэдрэлийн хоёр коддогч ашиглаж байна. Дараа нь бид шинэ дүгнэлтийн тодорхойлолтын зорилгоор шинэ тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын өөрчлөлтийг хүргэх зорилгоор дүгнэж байна. USPTO өгөгдлийн хэмжээний том хэмжээний туршилтаас бид стандарт BERT шинэчлэлийн тусламжтайгаар шинэчлэл болон санал өгөгдлийн хооронд зөв харилцаа сурах боломжтой байна. Гэхдээ бидний цаг хугацааны хамааралтай шинэ санаанууд дээр нэмэгдүүлдэг. Мөн хайлтын орон зайг багасгаж, бидний монотон зөвхөн багасгаж, хайлтын орон зайд эерэг сэтгэл санааг илүү сайжруулж, илүү жижиг үйлдвэрлэлт ашиглаж чадна.', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie szans na zatwierdzenie zgłoszenia patentowego jest trudnym problemem z wieloma aspektami. Najważniejszym aspektem jest prawdopodobnie nowość --- \\emph{35 US Code s 102} odrzuca nowsze wnioski, które mają bardzo podobne uprzednie dziedziny sztuki. Takie oceny nowości różnią się od przewidywania zatwierdzenia patentu od klasyfikacji konwencjonalnej dokumentów --- Skuteczne zgłoszenia patentowe mogą mieć podobne wzorce pisania; Jednakże zbyt podobne nowsze aplikacje otrzymałyby odwrotną etykietę, co pomyliłoby standardowe klasyfikatory dokumentów (np. BERT). Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy nowatorski framework \\our, który ujednolica klasyfikator dokumentów z ręcznie wykonanymi funkcjami, szczególnie zależnymi od czasu wynikami nowości. W szczególności formułujemy punkty nowości porównując każdą aplikację z milionami dzieł sztuki poprzedzając hybrydę wydajnych filtrów i neuronowego bi-kodera. Ponadto wprowadzamy nowy termin regularyzacyjny do celu klasyfikacji w celu egzekwowania monotonicznej zmiany predykcji homologacji w.r.t. wyników nowości. Z obszernych eksperymentów na dużej skali zbioru danych USPTO stwierdzimy, że standardowe dostrajanie BERT może częściowo nauczyć się prawidłowego związku między nowością a zatwierdzeniami z niespójnych danych. Jednak nasze zależne od czasu funkcje nowości oferują dodatkowy impuls. Ponadto nasza monotoniczna regulacja, jednocześnie zmniejszając przestrzeń wyszukiwania, może doprowadzić optymalizator do lepszej lokalnej optymalizacji, dając kolejny niewielki wzrost wydajności.', 'ro': 'Prevederea șansei de aprobare a unei cereri de brevet este o problemă provocatoare care implică mai multe fațete. Fațeta cea mai crucială este, probabil, noutatea -- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} respinge aplicațiile mai recente care au arte anterioare foarte similare. Astfel de evaluări ale noutății diferă previziunea aprobării brevetului de clasificarea documentelor convenționale --- Cererile de brevet de succes pot avea modele similare de scriere; Cu toate acestea, aplicațiile mai noi asemănătoare ar primi eticheta opusă, confuzând astfel clasificatorii standard de documente (de exemplu, BERT). Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem un nou cadru \\nostru care unifică clasificatorul de documente cu caracteristici artizanale, în special scoruri de noutate dependente de timp. Mai exact, formulăm scorurile de noutate comparând fiecare aplicație cu milioane de arte anterioare folosind un hibrid de filtre eficiente și un bi-encoder neural. Mai mult decât atât, impunem un nou termen de regularizare în obiectivul clasificării pentru a impune schimbarea monotonă a predicției de aprobare cu scoruri de noutate. Din experimentele extinse efectuate pe un set de date USPTO la scară largă, constatăm că reglarea fină standard BERT poate învăța parțial relația corectă dintre noutate și aprobări din date inconsistente. Cu toate acestea, caracteristicile noastre de noutate dependente de timp oferă un impuls în plus. De asemenea, regularizarea noastră monotonică, în timp ce micșorează spațiul de căutare, poate conduce optimizatorul la o optimă locală mai bună, obținând un câștig de performanță suplimentar mic.', 'no': 'Førehandsvising av godkjenningssjansen for ein patentprogram er eit vanskeleg problem med fleire ansiktar. Den viktigste ansikten er argumentert nyttigheten -- -\\emph{35 U.S. kode 102} avviser fleire nyleg program som har svært liknande førre kunst. Desse nyttighetsevalueringane forskjeller forhåndsvisinga av patent-godkjenning frå konvensjonell dokumentklassifikasjon --- Suksesfulle patent-program kan dele liknande skrivemønsterelement. men for liknande nye program vil motta den motsatte merkelappen, slik at standardklassifikasjonar (f.eks. BERT) er forvirrande. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi eit nytt rammeverk\\ vårt som unifiserer dokumentklassifiseringen med handhaldne funksjonar, spesielt tidavhengige novelscorer. Spesielt formerer vi opplysningane ved å sammenligne kvar program med millioner av førre kunst med ein hybrid av effektiv filterar og ein neural-bi-kodar. I tillegg legg vi inn eit ny reguleringsuttrykk i klassifikasjonsverktålet for å køyra den monotoniske endringen av godkjenningsforegåva, dvs. noverande poeng. Fra utvida eksperimenter på eit stor USPTO-dataset, finn vi at standardsfinnstilling av BERT kan delvis lære korrekte forhold mellom nyttighet og godkjenning frå inkonsistente data. Tidsavhengige nyttighetsfunksjonar har imidlertid ein økning over det. Dette kan også gjere monotoniske regularisasjonen vår, mens søkjemodus krymperer, optimaliseren kan føre til bedre lokale optima og gjere meir lite utvikling.', 'sr': 'Predviđanje mogućnosti odobrenja patenata je izazovni problem uključujući više lica. Najvažnije lice je da je novost --- \\emph{35 U.S. kodeks 102} odbacuje nedavne aplikacije koje imaju veoma slične prethodne umjetnosti. Takve nove procjene razlikuju predviđanje odobrenja patenata iz klasifikacije konvencionalnih dokumenta --- Uspješne aplikacije patenata mogu podijeliti slične obrasce pisanja; međutim, previše slične nove aplikacije bi primile suprotnu etiketu, tako zbunjujući standardne klasifikatore dokumenta (npr. BERT). Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predlažemo nov okvir naš koji ujedinjuje klasifikatora dokumenta sa rukopisanim karakteristikama, posebno rezultati novosti ovisnog o vremenu. Posebno, formuliramo rezultate novosti uspoređujući svaku aplikaciju sa milionima prethodnih umjetnosti koristeći hibrid efikasnih filtara i neuralnog bi-kodera. Osim toga, nameštamo novi izraz regularizacije u cilj klasifikacije da se primjenjuje monotonska promjena predviđanja odobrenja i novih rezultata. Iz širokih eksperimenata na velikoj USPTO-ovoj seti podataka, nalazimo se da standardna BERT finalizacija djelomično može naučiti ispravnu vezu između novosti i odobrenja iz nepristojnih podataka. Međutim, naši novi karakteristiki ovisni o vremenu nude pojačanje na njemu. Također, naša monotonska regularizacija, dok smanjuje prostor pretraživanja, može optimizirati bolju lokalnu optimu, pružajući daljnji mali dobitak izvođenja.', 'si': 'පැටෙන්ට් යුද්ධයක් ගැන අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. වැදගත් මුහුණු මුහුණ තමයි අවස්ථාවක් --- \\emph{35 U.S. කෝඩ් 102} අලුත් අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ මුහුණු කලින අනුවෙන් අවුල් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය වෙනස් වෙන්නේ පැටෙන්ට් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dර ඒත්, අලුත් අලුත් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් ලේබල් එක පිළිගන්න පුළුවන්, ඉතින් ප්\u200dරමාණික විශේෂකය ( මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා\\ අපේ විදිහට ලිපින්ත විශේෂකය සමග විශේෂයෙන් ප විශේෂයෙන්, අපි අවස්ථාවක් ස්කෝර්ම් කරනවා හැම අවස්ථාවක්ම මිලියන්ස් කලාවක් සමග සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය ස්කෝර තවත්, අපි අළුත් සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් පරීක්ෂණය අරමුණ වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dය විධානය කරන්න. ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් USPTO දත්ත සෙට් එකේ ප්\u200dරමාණ පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශාල BERT හොඳ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා අවස්ථාවක් සමග නමුත්, අපේ වෙලාව අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් ඒක ඉහළට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්. ඒවගේම, අපේ මොනෝටෝනික සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසය, පරීක්ෂණ අවසානය අඩු වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, ස්ථානික විශ්වාසයෙක්ව හොඳ ස', 'so': "Horumarinta ogolaanshaha codsiga pataanku waa dhibaato adag oo ku saabsan facyo badan. Wajigaaga ugu muhiimsan ee ugu muhiimsan waa warqada -tusaale ahaan Codeynta 35 Mareykanka 102} waxay diidaa codsiyada ugu dambeysa ee ay leeyihiin farshaxan aad u eg farshaxan hore. Qiimeynta saxda ah waxey ka duwan yihiin aqoonsiga ruqsada aabanimada oo ka mid ah fasalka wargeyska caadiga ah --- codsiga succeeded ah waxay ku qeybsan karaan noocyada qoraalka oo isku mid ah; Si kastaba ha ahaatee codsiga cusub e e u e g waxay heli doonaan calaamada kala duwan, sidaa darteed waxay dhibaataysan fasaxyada dokumenta standard (tusaale ahaan BERT). Si aan arrintan ula macaamiloono, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal warqad ah oo ku qoran koorasyada dukumentiga, khaas ahaan xilliga ku saabsan kooxaha warqadda. Si gaar ah, waxaynu sameynaa kooxda sawirada, si aan u dhigno mid kasta oo codsigiisa la mid ah milliyan farshaxan horay, si aan ugu isticmaalno hibrid ah filter-faa’iido leh iyo mid kooban. Sidoo kale waxaynu qoraynaa waqti cusub oo la soo saaray qasabka fasaxa, si aan loo sameeyo beddelka qofka qofka laga beddelo ogolaanshiyaha, tusaale ahaan scoraha hore. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku qoran macluumaad badan oo USPTO, waxaynu ka heleynaa in alaabta caadiga ah ee BERT ay qeyb ahaan u barto xiriirka saxda ah ee ku dhexaysa xiriirka saxda ah iyo ogolaanshiyaha macluumaadka aan la mid ahayn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ciwaayadayada waqtiga ku xiran waxyaabaha la xiriira waxay ku fidiyaan boost. Sidoo kale nidaamka qofkeena ah, marka aad goobta raadinta ka dhameysaneyso, wuxuu u wadi karaa kuwa ugu wanaagsan optimiska degmada, wuxuuna keenaa faa'iido dheeraad ah oo ka mid ah shaqo raadinta.", 'ta': 'ஒரு பாதுகாப்பு பயன்பாட்டின் அனுமதி வாய்ப்பை தயாராக்குவது பல முகங்களை சேர்க்கும் சவாலிக்க பிரச்சனை மிகவும் முக்கியமான முகப்புக்குறியீடு என்பது புத்தகத்திற்கு தெரியும் - \\emph {35 அமெரிக்க குறியீடு 102} முன்னால் கலைகள் உள்ளது அதே ப இத்தகைய புதிய விளக்கங்கள் பொதுவான ஆவண வகைப்பாட்டிலிருந்து பாதுகாப்பு அனுமதி முன்னெழுத்து வித்தியாசமாகும் - வெற்றிக ஆனால், அதே போன்ற புதிய பயன்பாடுகள் எதிர் விளக்கச்சீட்டில் பெறும், அதனால் நிலையான ஆவண வகுப்பாடுகளை குழப்பமாக்கும் (உ.  இந்த பிரச்சனையை முகவரிக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது ஆவண வகைப்பாட்டை கைமுறையாக்கப்பட்ட பண்புகளுடன் ஒன்றுசேர்க குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் ஒவ்வொரு பயன்பாடுக்கும் மில்லியன் முன் கலைகளை ஒப்பிட்டு ஒவ்வொரு புதிய மதிப்பெண்களை உருவாக்குகிறோம் பயன்பாட்டி மேலும், நாம் ஒரு புதிய விதிமுறையை வகுப்பு பொருளுக்கு ஏற்படுத்துகிறோம் புதிய விதிமுறையை மாற்றுகிறோம் மற்றும் புதிய விதி பெரிய USPTO தகவல் அமைப்பில் உள்ள விரிவான சோதனைகளில் இருந்து, நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் நிலையான பிரெட் சரியான தொடர்பை பார்க்கலாம் புதிய தொடர் ஆனால், எங்கள் நேரத்தில் சார்ந்த புத்தகத்தின் குணங்கள் அதில் மேல் ஒரு பெரியத்தை வழங்குகிறது. மேலும், எங்கள் மானோடோனிக் கட்டுப்பாடு, தேடு வெளியை குறைக்கும் போது, சிறந்த உள்ளூர் விருப்பத்திற்கு மேலும் சிறிய செயல்', 'sv': 'Att förutse möjligheten att godkänna en patentansökan är ett utmanande problem med flera aspekter. Den viktigaste aspekten är utan tvekan nyheten -- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} avvisar nyare applikationer som har mycket liknande tidigare konst. Sådana nya utvärderingar skiljer sig från prognosen för patentgodkännande från konventionell dokumentklassificering --- Framgångsrika patentansökningar kan ha liknande skrivmönster. För liknande nyare tillämpningar skulle dock få motsatt etikett, vilket förvirrar standardiserade dokumentklassificerare (t.ex. BERT). För att ta itu med denna fråga föreslår vi ett nytt ramverk \\vår som förenar dokumentklassificeraren med handgjorda funktioner, särskilt tidsberoende nyhetspoäng. Specifikt formulerar vi de nya poängen genom att jämföra varje applikation med miljontals tidigare konst med hjälp av en hybrid av effektiva filter och en neural bi-encoder. Dessutom inför vi en ny regulatoriseringsterm i klassificeringsmålet för att genomdriva den monotona förändringen av godkännandeprognosen w.r.t. nyhetspoäng. Från omfattande experiment på en storskalig USPTO-datauppsättning finner vi att standard BERT-finjustering delvis kan lära sig det korrekta förhållandet mellan nyhet och godkännanden från inkonsekventa data. Men våra tidsberoende nyheter erbjuder en boost utöver det. Dessutom kan vår monotona regularisering, samtidigt som sökutrymmet krymper, driva optimeringsverktyget till bättre lokalt optima, vilket ger ytterligare en liten prestandaökning.', 'ur': 'ایک پیٹینٹ اپلیٹ کی تصدیق کی فرصت کی پیش کرنا ایک مشکل ہے جو بہت سی چہروں کے ساتھ مشکل ہے. زیادہ اہم چہرے مثال یہ ہے کہ نوائی ہے--- \\emph{35 U.S. کڈ 102} اچھے اگلے کاروباروں کو جھٹلاتا ہے جو بہت ہی اگلے هنر ہیں. ایسی نئی تحقیقات کی مختلف طریقے سے پٹیٹ منفی کی تصدیق کی مختلف ہوتی ہے سند کلاسیفوں سے --- موفق پٹیٹ پٹیٹ اپنا کاروبار ایسی طرح لکھنے کی طرح شریک کرسکتا ہے۔ لیکن بہت سی نئی اپنا کاروبار مخالف لیبل حاصل کریں گے، اسی طرح استاندارڈ ڈکومکٹ کلیسٹر (جیسے BERT)۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم نے ایک نوی فرمود کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ہاتھ کرپٹ کے فرمود کے ساتھ دکھانے والی فرمود کرتا ہے، مخصوصاً وقت-dependent novelty scores سے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم نے ہر اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اگلوں کے مطابق میلیونوں اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا فیلٹر اور ایک نی اور اس کے بعد ہم نے ایک نئی سیدھی قانون ترمیم کو کلاسیفوں کا مقصد میں رکھا ہے تاکہ موافقت کی تغییر کی موافقت کی ایک موافقت تغییر قائم کریں ایک بڑے اسکیل USPTO ڈیٹ سٹ پر بہت بڑے تجربے سے، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ استاندارڈ BERT فین ٹونگ کے ذریعہ ایک حصہ سے نوائی اور منصفات کے درمیان درست رابطہ سیکھ سکتا ہے۔ اگرچہ ہمارے وقت-dependent نوائی فرصت اس پر اضافہ کرتی ہیں۔ اور ہماری منوٹونی سیدھی رسمیزی، جہاد کی جگہ کم کر رہی ہے، بہترین سیدھی رسمیزی کو بہترین سیدھی رسمیزی پر چلاسکتا ہے، اور بہترین چھوٹی عملکرد کا فائدہ اٹھاتا ہے.', 'lt': 'Patentų paraiškos patvirtinimo galimybės numatymas yra sudėtinga problem a, susijusi su įvairiais aspektais. Svarbiausias aspektas yra galbūt naujovė --- \\emph{35 JAV kodeksas 102} atmeta naujausias paraiškas, kurios turi labai panašius ankstesnius menas. Such novelty evaluations differ the patent approval prediction from conventional document classification --- Successful patent applications may share similar writing patterns;  tačiau panašios naujos paraiškos gautų priešingą etiketę, taigi supainiotų standartinius dokumentų klasifikatorius (pvz., BERT). To address this issue, we propose a novel framework \\our that unifies the document classifier with handcrafted features, particularly time-dependent novelty scores.  Specifically, we formulate the novelty scores by comparing each application with millions of prior arts using a hybrid of efficient filters and a neural bi-encoder.  Moreover, we impose a new regularization term into the classification objective to enforce the monotonic change of approval prediction w.r.t. novelty scores.  Iš didelio masto USPTO duomenų rinkinio atliktų eksperimentų matyti, kad standartinis BERT patobulinimas iš dalies gali išsiaiškinti teisingą naujovių ir patvirtinimų ryšį iš nesuderinamų duomenų. However, our time-dependent novelty features offer a boost on top of it.  Be to, mūsų monotoninė reguliarizacija, sutrumpindama paieškos erdvę, gali paskatinti optimizatorių siekti geresnių vietinių optimumų ir dar mažai padidinti našumą.', 'uz': "Name Eng muhim facetning eng muhimligi hayoti -- \\m {35 Amerika kodi 102} bir necha yaxshi sanalar bilan bir xil dasturlarni rad etish mumkin. Ushbu novelning qiymatlari qoʻllanilgan hujjat darajasini qoʻshish uchun qoʻllanmalar taʼminlovchi boʻladi --- muvaffaqiyatli patent dasturlari huddi yozish tugmalarini qayta boʻlishi mumkin; Ammo, bir xil yangi dasturlar bir xil yorliqga qabul qiladi, shunday qilib standard hujjatning turlarini ajratish mumkin (m. g. BERT). Bu muammoga murojaat qilish uchun biz hujjatni qoʻllab qoʻllab qoʻllanilgan xususiyatlar bilan birlashtirish va vaqtга таваккал qiladigan novel freymini tahrirlash. Koʻrsatilgan, biz har bir dastur foydalanuvchi filterlar va neural bi- kodi bilan millionlab rasmlar bilan birlashtirish mumkin. Ko'rib, biz bir necha boshqaruvchi soʻzni tasdiqlash maqsadiga qo'llab beramiz. Yangi boshqaruvchi soʻzni o'zgartirish uchun From extensive experiments on a large-scale USPTO dataset, we find that standard BERT fine-tuning can partially learn the correct relationship between novelty and approvals from inconsistent data.  Lekin bizning vaqtga ishlatuvchi novelimizning xususiyatlarimiz bu yuqoridagi tuxushni beradi. Ko'rib, bizning monotonik boshqaruvchimiz boshqaruvchimiz, qidirish joyini kamaytirishda, lokal optimizga eng yaxshi ko'proq ishlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Định trước cơ hội chấp nhận ứng dụng bằng sáng chế là một vấn đề khó khăn liên quan đến nhiều mặt. Phần quan trọng nhất là yếu tố mới lạ..\\\\\\\\ emph{35 U.S. Mã s 102} nhả ra các ứng dụng gần đây có các loại nghệ thuật trước rất giống nhau. Những đánh giá mới lạ khác nhau về dự đoán bằng sáng chế thông thường... ứng dụng bằng sáng chế có thể có kết quả giống nhau. Tuy nhiên, những ứng dụng mới tương tự sẽ nhận nhãn ngược lại, khiến người phân loại tài liệu tiêu chuẩn bị nhầm (v.d. BERT). Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở mới có thể hợp nhất người phân loại tài liệu với các tính năng tự làm, đặc biệt những điểm mới phụ thuộc thời gian. Cụ thể, chúng ta có thể phát bi ểu điểm mới bằng cách so sánh mỗi ứng dụng với hàng triệu tác phẩm trước sử dụng một hỗn hợp các bộ lọc hiệu quả và mã hóa thần kinh. Hơn nữa, chúng t ôi áp đặt một thuật ngữ luân hồi mới vào mục tiêu phân loại nhằm thực hiện một sự thay đổi đơn điệu của dự đoán thông tin dị ứng w.r.t. các điểm mới. Từ các thí nghiệm đầy đủ trên một tập tin lưu lượng lớn của USPTO, chúng tôi thấy kết quả đúng đắn của BERT có thể học được một phần sự liên quan giữa sự mới và sự phê bình từ dữ liệu mâu thuẫn. Tuy nhiên, những nét mới phụ thuộc thời gian giúp tăng thêm sức mạnh. Đồng thời, việc chỉnh hoá đơn điệu, trong khi làm giảm khoảng trống tìm kiếm, cũng có thể điều khiển khả năng đạt hiệu suất tối đa hơn, cung cấp thêm một lợi nhuận nhỏ nữa.', 'da': 'At forudsige godkendelseschancen for en patentansøgning er et udfordrende problem, der involverer flere facetter. Den mest afgørende aspekt er nok nyheden -- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} afviser nyere ansøgninger, der har meget lignende tidligere kunst. Sådanne nyhedsvurderinger adskiller forudsigelsen for patentgodkendelse fra konventionel dokumentklassificering --- Succesfulde patentansøgninger kan dele lignende skriftmønstre . For lignende nyere applikationer ville imidlertid modtage den modsatte mærkning, hvilket ville forvirre standardklassificeringer af dokumenter (f.eks. BERT). For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en ny ramme \\vores, der forener dokumentklassificeringen med håndlavede funktioner, især tidsafhængige nyheder scores. Specielt formulerer vi de nye scorer ved at sammenligne hver applikation med millioner af tidligere kunst ved hjælp af en hybrid af effektive filtre og en neural bi-encoder. Desuden indfører vi en ny reguleringsbetegnelse i klassifikationsmålet for at håndhæve den monotone ændring af godkendelsesforudsigelse w.r.t. nyheder scores. Ud fra omfattende eksperimenter på et stort USPTO datasæt finder vi, at standard BERT finjustering delvist kan lære det korrekte forhold mellem nyhed og godkendelser ud fra inkonsekvente data. Men vores tidsafhængige nyhedsfunktioner giver et løft oven i det. Desuden kan vores monotone regulering, samtidig med at søgepladsen krænkes, drive optimatoren til bedre lokal optima, hvilket giver en yderligere lille ydeevne gevinst.', 'nl': 'Het voorspellen van de goedkeuringskans van een octrooiaanvraag is een uitdagend probleem met meerdere facetten. Het meest cruciale aspect is ongetwijfeld de nieuwheid --- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} verwerpt recentere aanvragen met zeer vergelijkbare vooraanstaande kunsten. Dergelijke nieuwigheidsevaluaties verschillen de voorspelling van octrooigemachtiging van conventionele documentclassificatie --- Succesvolle octrooiaanvragen kunnen vergelijkbare schrijfpatronen hebben; Echter, te soortgelijke nieuwere toepassingen zouden het tegenovergestelde label ontvangen, waardoor standaardclassificatoren voor documenten (bv. BERT) verwarrend zouden raken. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw framework \\our voor dat de documentclassificator verenigt met handgemaakte functies, met name tijdafhankelijke nieuwigheidsscores. Specifiek formuleren we de nieuwigheidsscore door elke toepassing te vergelijken met miljoenen vooraanstaande kunsten met behulp van een hybride van efficiënte filters en een neurale bi-encoder. Bovendien leggen we een nieuwe regularisatieterm op in de classificatiedoelstelling om de monotone verandering van goedkeuringsvoorspelling te handhaven w.r.t. novelty scores. Uit uitgebreide experimenten met een grootschalige USPTO dataset blijkt dat standaard BERT finetuning gedeeltelijk de juiste relatie tussen nieuwigheid en goedkeuringen kan leren uit inconsistente gegevens. Onze tijdafhankelijke nieuwigheidsfuncties bieden echter nog een boost. Ook kan onze monotone regularisatie, terwijl de zoekruimte krimpt, de optimizer naar betere lokale optima drijven, wat een verdere kleine prestatiewinst oplevert.', 'hr': 'Predviđanje mogućnosti odobrenja patenata je izazovan problem uključujući više lica. Najvažnije lice je navodno novost --- \\emph{35 U.S. kodeks 102} odbacuje nedavne primjene koje imaju vrlo slične prethodne umjetnosti. Takve procjene novosti razlikuju predviđanje odobrenja patenata iz klasifikacije konvencionalnih dokumenta --- Uspješne patenata aplikacije mogu podijeliti slične obrasce pisanja; međutim, previše slične nove aplikacije bi primile suprotnu etiketu, tako zbunjujući standardne klasifikatore dokumenta (npr. BERT). Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predlažemo nov okvir \\naš koji ujedinjava klasifikatora dokumenta s rukopisanim karakteristikama, posebno rezultati novosti ovisnosti o vremenu. Posebno, formuliramo rezultate novosti uspoređujući svaku primjenu sa milijunima prethodnih umjetnosti koristeći hibrid efikasnih filtara i neuralnog bi-kodera. Osim toga, stavljamo novi izraz regularizacije u cilj klasifikacije kako bi se primjenjivali monotonska promjena predviđanja odobrenja i novih rezultata. Iz širokih eksperimenata na velikoj skupini USPTO podataka, nalazimo se da standardna finalizacija BERT djelomično može naučiti ispravnu vezu između novosti i odobrenja iz nepristojnih podataka. Međutim, naši novi karakteristiki ovisni o vremenu nude pojačanje na vrhu toga. Također, naša monotonska regularizacija, dok smanjuje prostor pretraživanja, može dovesti optimizatora do bolje lokalne optime, pružajući daljnji mali dobitak učinka.', 'bg': 'Прогнозирането на шансовете за одобрение на заявление за патент е предизвикателен проблем, включващ множество аспекти. Най-важният аспект е несъмнено новостта ---\\емх{35 американски кодекс 102} отхвърля по-скорошни заявления, които имат много подобни предишни изкуства. Тези оценки на новостите различават прогнозата за одобрение на патент от конвенционалната класификация на документите --- Успешните заявления за патент могат да имат сходни модели на писане; Въпреки това, твърде подобни по-нови приложения биха получили обратния етикет, като по този начин объркват стандартните класификатори на документи (напр. BERT). За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме нова рамка, която обединява класификатора на документи с ръчно изработени функции, особено зависими от времето резултати за новости. По-конкретно, формулираме резултатите от новостите, като сравняваме всяко приложение с милиони предишни изкуства, използвайки хибрид от ефективни филтри и невронен бикодер. Нещо повече, налагаме нов термин за регламентиране в класификационната цел за прилагане на монотонното изменение на прогнозата за одобрение с оценките за новости. От обширни експерименти с мащабен набор от данни откриваме, че стандартното фино настройване на BERT може частично да научи правилната връзка между новост и одобрения от непоследователни данни. Въпреки това, нашите зависими от времето новости предлагат тласък върху него. Също така, нашата монотонна регулировка, докато свива пространството за търсене, може да доведе оптимизатора до по-добра локална оптима, което води до допълнително малко увеличение на производителността.', 'id': 'Memprediksi kesempatan persetujuan aplikasi paten adalah masalah yang menantang yang melibatkan berbagai facet. Hal yang paling penting adalah kemungkinan baru --- \\emph{35 Kode AS 102} menolak aplikasi baru-baru ini yang memiliki seni sebelumnya yang sangat mirip. Evaluasi baru seperti ini berbeda dengan prediksi persetujuan paten dari klasifikasi dokumen konvensional --- Aplikasi paten sukses dapat berbagi pola tulisan yang sama; namun, aplikasi baru yang terlalu serupa akan menerima label yang bertentangan, sehingga membingungkan klassifikasi standar dokumen (contohnya BERT). Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan baru \\kami yang menyatukan klasifikasi dokumen dengan ciri-ciri karya tangan, terutama skor baru tergantung pada waktu. Secara spesifik, kita menyusun skor baru dengan membandingkan setiap aplikasi dengan jutaan seni sebelumnya menggunakan hibrid filter efisien dan bi-encoder saraf. Selain itu, kita memaksa istilah regularisasi baru ke dalam tujuan klasifikasi untuk memaksa perubahan monotonik prediksi persetujuan W.r.t. skor baru. Dari eksperimen ekstensif pada set data USPTO skala besar, kami menemukan bahwa penyesuaian BERT standar bisa sebagian belajar hubungan yang benar antara novelti dan persetujuan dari data yang tidak konsisten. Namun, ciri-ciri baru tergantung pada waktu kami menawarkan sebuah dorongan di atasnya. Juga, regularisasi monotonik kita, sementara mengurangi ruang pencarian, dapat mendorong optimisasi ke optimum lokal yang lebih baik, memberikan lebih sedikit keuntungan prestasi.', 'de': 'Die Vorhersage der Genehmigungschance einer Patentanmeldung ist ein herausforderndes Problem mit mehreren Facetten. Die wichtigste Facette ist wohl die Neuheit --- \\emph{35 US Code s 102} lehnt neuere Anwendungen ab, die einen sehr ähnlichen Stand der Technik haben. Solche Neuigkeitsbewertungen unterscheiden sich von der Vorhersage der Patentgenehmigung von der herkömmlichen Dokumentenklassifizierung --- Erfolgreiche Patentanmeldungen können ähnliche Schreibmuster aufweisen; Allerdings würden zu ähnliche neuere Anwendungen das entgegengesetzte Etikett erhalten, wodurch Standardklassifikatoren (z.B. BERT) verwirren würden. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neuartiges Framework \\our vor, das den Dokumentenklassifikator mit handgefertigten Funktionen, insbesondere zeitabhängigen Novelty Scores, vereinheitlicht. Konkret formulieren wir die Neuheitswerte, indem wir jede Anwendung mit Millionen von Stand der Technik vergleichen, indem wir einen Hybrid aus effizienten Filtern und einem neuronalen Bi-Encoder verwenden. Darüber hinaus wird ein neuer Regularisierungstermin in das Klassifizierungsziel eingeführt, um die monotone Änderung der Genehmigungsvorhersage w.r.t. Novelty Scores durchzusetzen. Aus umfangreichen Experimenten an einem großen USPTO-Datensatz zeigen wir, dass die Standard-BERT-Feinabstimmung teilweise den richtigen Zusammenhang zwischen Neuheit und Zulassungen aus inkonsistenten Daten lernen kann. Unsere zeitabhängigen Neuheiten bieten jedoch noch einen Schub dazu. Außerdem kann unsere monotone Regularisierung, während der Suchraum schrumpft, den Optimierer zu besseren lokalen Optima treiben, was einen weiteren kleinen Leistungszuwachs ergibt.', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی فرصت تصمیم پذیرفتن یک کاربرد patent یک مشکل مشکل مشکلی است که شامل چند چهره است. بزرگترین صورت جدید این است که نویسی --- emph{35 U.S. Code 102} از کاربردهای اخیرا که هنر پیشینیان بسیار شبیه دارند، رد می\u200cکند. چنین ارزیابی تازه\u200cها پیش\u200cبینی پذیرش پرونده\u200cهای سند معمولی را تفاوت می\u200cکنند --- کاربردهای پرونده\u200cهای موفقیت ممکن است الگوهای نوشتن مشابه را شریک کنند. با این وجود، کاربردهای جدید زیادی مشابه دارند که برچسب مخالف را دریافت کنند، به نتیجه کلی\u200cکنندگان سند استاندارد (مثال BERT). برای حل این مسئله، ما یک چهارچوب جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با ویژه\u200cهای دستی بستگی به زمان تهیه می\u200cکند. به طور خاصی، ما امتیاز تازه\u200cها را با مقایسه کردن هر کاربرد با میلیون\u200cها هنر پیشینه با استفاده از هیبراد فیلترهای موثر و یک دوکدهر عصبی فرمودیم. به علاوه، ما یک کلمه ساده\u200cسازی جدید را در هدف مختصات قرار می\u200cدهیم تا تغییر monotonic تغییر پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای پذیرفته\u200cای که به عنوان نقطه\u200cهای تازه می\u200cباشد تحت تاثیر قرار دهیم. از آزمایشات بسیار زیادی در مجموعه داده های USPTO بزرگ می یابیم که استاندارد نیکوترین تنظیم BERT می تواند قسمتی رابطه درست بین نویسی و تأیید از داده های ناپایدار یاد بگیرد. با این حال، ویژه های نوی بستگی به زمان ما بر روی آن افزایش می دهد. همچنین، ساده\u200cسازی monotonic ما، در حالی که فضای جستجو را کاهش می\u200cکند، می\u200cتواند optimizer را به optima محلی بهتر رانندگی کند، و به سود کاربرد کوچک بیشتری می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '특허 신청의 비준 기회를 예측하는 것은 도전적인 문제로 여러 방면에 관련된다.가장 중요한 부분은 참신성이라고 할 수 있다. \\emph {35 U.S.Code S 102}는 기존 기술과 매우 비슷한 최신 응용을 거부했다.이런 참신성 평가는 전통 문헌 분류의 특허 비준 예측과 다르다. 성공한 특허 신청은 비슷한 작성 모델을 가지고 있을 수 있다.그러나 너무 비슷한 새 응용 프로그램은 상반된 탭을 받아서 표준 문서 분류기(예를 들어 BERT)를 혼동할 수 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 문서 분류기와 수작업으로 만든 기능, 특히 시간과 관련된 참신성 점수를 결합시키는 새로운 틀을 제시했다.구체적으로 말하면 우리는 고효율 필터와 신경 쌍코딩기의 혼합을 통해 모든 응용을 수백만 개의 기존 기술과 비교하여 참신성 점수를 얻는다.그 밖에 우리는 분류 목표에 새로운 정규화 항목을 추가하여 w.r.t. 참신성 점수의 단조로운 변화를 예측하는 비준을 강화했다.대규모 USPTO 데이터 세트의 대량 실험에서 우리는 표준적인 버트 마이크로스피커가 일치하지 않는 데이터에서 참신성과 승인 간의 정확한 관계를 부분적으로 이해할 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.그러나 시간과 관련된 신기한 기능은 그 기초 위에서 향상되었다.그 밖에 우리의 단조로운 정규화는 검색 공간을 축소하는 동시에 최적화기를 구동하여 더욱 좋은 부분적 최적화를 얻고 비교적 작은 성능 이득을 얻을 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Patent uygulamasynyň razylygynyň mümkinçiligini öňden berip bilmek birnäçe ýüz bilen täsirli meseledir. Iň wajyp surat, olaryň täze görnüşleri --- \\emph{35 U.S. ködler 102} iň öňki sanat bilen meňzeş bolan uygulamalaryny ret edip biler. Böyle täze deňlenmeler patent razylygynyň düzenli sened klasifikasyndan üýtgedir --- üstünlikli paten uygulamalaryň ýazma nusgalaryny paýlaşyp biler; Ýöne täze ýaşly täze äplikeýşenler ters etiket alýarlar, şonuň üçin standart sened klasifikatyny çaşyrýardy (meselâ, BERT). Bu meselede çözmek üçin, biz täze bir çerçew teklip edýäris \\we ol senediň klasifikatyny el çapçilikleri bilen birleştirir, iň bellenen wagtyň baglany täze notlary bilen birleştirir. Adatça, biz her uygulamalary millioniň öňki sanat bilen täsirli filtreler we neural bir ködler bilen karşılaşyp taýýarlançylyklary şekilleşdirýäris. Mundan soňr a, biz t äze düzgün düzgün sözleri klasifikasiýa maksadyna t a ýýarlamak üçin, w.r.w. taýýarlama düzgünlerini üýtgetmek üçin täze bir düzgün sözleri goýýarys. Ullakan USPTO datawatlaryň üstünde örän uly deneylerden, standart BERT taýýarlama şeklinde nädogry ýagdaýynyň we maksadyň arasyndaky baglaýyşyny parça öwrenip biler. Ýöne wagtymyzdan baglanýan täzeliklerimiz üstünde üýtgetmegi teklip edýär. Mundan hem, biziň monotonik düzenlemegimiz, arama alanyny azaltyp, optimizçimizi ýerleşýän optimalara gowy sürüp biler, kiçi bir hereket gazanlygymyz biler.', 'af': "Die toestemmingskans van 'n patenttoepassing is 'n pragtige probleem wat veelvuldige aangesigte invoer. Die mees kruipende aangesig is argumenteerlik die nuutskap --- \\emph{35 U.S. kode s 102} verwerp meer nuutste toepassings wat baie gelyk vooraf kunste het. Hierdie nuwe evaluasies verskil die patenttoestemmingsvoorskou van konvensionale dokumentklasifikasie --- Suksesfol patenttoepassings kan soortgelyke skryfpatrone deel; maar te-gelykbaar nuwe toepassings sal die teenwoordige etiket ontvang, sodat verdwyn standaard dokumentklassifiseerders (bv. BERT). Om hierdie probleem te adres, voorstel ons 'n nuwe raamwerk\\ ons wat die dokumentklassifiseerder eenmaak met handkryfde funksies, spesifieke tyd- afhanklike nuwe punte. Spesifieke, ons formeer die nuwe telling deur elke aansoek te vergelyk met miljoene van vorige kunste deur 'n hibrid van effektief filters en 'n neurale bi-enkoder te gebruik. Ook, ons stel 'n nuwe regularisasie term in die klassifikasie doel om die monotoniese verandering van toestemming voorskou te vervul, t.e. nuutskappy. Van uitbreidige eksperimente op 'n groot-skaal USPTO datastel, vind ons dat standaard BERT fyn-tuning gedeeltelik die korrekte verhouding tussen nuwerheid en toeganklikhede van inkonsistente data kan leer. Maar ons tyd-afhanklike nuwerheidsfunksies offer 'n booster op dit. Ook, ons monotoniese regularisasie, terwyl die soektog spasie verklein, kan die optimeerder na beter plaaslike optima draai, en 'n verdere klein prestasie verkry.", 'sq': 'Parashikimi i mundësisë së miratimit të një aplikimi patenti është një problem sfidues që përfshin shumë aspekte. Fakti më vendimtar është ndoshta noviteti --- \\emph{35 U.S. Code 102} kundërshton aplikimet më të fundit që kanë arte shumë të ngjashme të mëparshme. Vlerësimet e tilla të reja ndryshojnë parashikimin e miratimit të patentit nga klasifikimi konvencional i dokumenteve -- Aplikatat e suksesshme të patentit mund të ndajnë modele të ngjashme shkrimi; megjithatë, aplikime shumë të ngjashme më të reja do të marrin etiketën e kundërtë, duke konfuzuar kështu klasifikuesit standartë të dokumenteve (për shembull BERT). Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri \\jonë që unifikon klasifikuesin e dokumentit me karakteristika të ndërtuar me dorë, veçanërisht rezultate të reja të varura nga kohë. Veçanërisht, ne formojmë rezultatet e reja duke krahasuar çdo aplikim me miliona arte të mëparshme duke përdorur një hibridin e filtrave efikase dhe një dy-kodues nervor. Moreover, we impose a new regularization term into the classification objective to enforce the monotonic change of approval prediction w.r.t. novelty scores.  From extensive experiments on a large-scale USPTO dataset, we find that standard BERT fine-tuning can partially learn the correct relationship between novelty and approvals from inconsistent data.  Megjithatë, karakteristikat tona të reja të varura nga koha ofrojnë një rritje mbi të. Gjithashtu, rregullimi ynë monotonik, ndërsa zvogëlon hapësirën e kërkimit, mund të shtyjë optimizuesin në optimum më të mirë lokal, duke dhënë një fitim të vogël të mëtejshëm performancë.', 'am': 'የፕሮግራም ፕሮግራም ፈቃድ ማግኘት ማቅረብ በተጨማሪው የፊቶችን አካባቢዎች የሚያስጨንቅ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በጣም አስፈላጊው የፊስቴት የአሜሪካ ኮድ 102 ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ የኖሮአዊ ምርጫዎች አካባቢ ሰነድ መግለጫ - የሥልጣን ፕሮግራሞች የጽሑፍ ምሳሌዎችን እንዲያካክሉ ይለያያሉ፤ ምንም እንኳን፣ በተለያዩ አዲስ ፕሮግራሞች የሚቀበል ተቃውሞ ምልክት ይቀበላሉ፤ ስለዚህም የstandard ሰነድ ክፍተቶችን የሚያሳስል (ምሳሌ BERT). ለዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ የሰነዱን ሰነድ መጻፊያ በተለየ እጆቻችን፣ በተለየ ጊዜ-የታመነ የረኀብ ቀለሞች እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ በየፕሮግራሙን በመሊዮን የሚቆጠሩ አርእስቶች እና አካባቢ ሚሊዮን አርእስቶች እና የናውሬል ቢ-ኮድ በመጠቀም እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ አዲስ የሥርዓት ቁጥር ለመግለጫው አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በUSPTO ዳታ ማዕከላዊ ፈተናዎች ላይ ካለው፣ የብኤርቴት ጥሩ ማቀናቀል በጠቅላላ እና በማይታወስ ከዳታ መካከል እውነተኛውን ግንኙነት እንዲማር እና ማርናለን፡፡ However, our time-dependent novelty features offer a boost on top of it.  ደግሞ የሞቶኒካ ሥርዓታችንን፣ የፍለጉን ቦታ ሲጨርስ፣ የተሻለ የአገር ማረፊያ ማነሳቅና ደግሞ ትንሽ ሽፋን የሚያደርግ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հարտոնագրային աջակցության հնարավորության կանխատեսումը բազմաթիվ կողմերի ներառող դժվար խնդիր է: Ամենակարևորն այն է, որ հավանաբար նորությունն է --- \\Emph{35 ԱՄՆ կոդ s. Այսպիսի նորությունների գնահատումները տարբերվում են արտոնագրային ընդունության կանխատեսումը ավանդական փաստաթղթերի դասակարգումից. հաջողակ արտոնագրային ծրագրերը կարող են ունենալ նման գրական կաղապարներ: however, too-similar newer applications would receive the opposite label, thus confusing standard document classifiers (e.g., BERT).  Այս հարցին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր շրջանակ, որը միավորում է փաստաթղթի դասակարգիչը ձեռագործ հատկանիշների հետ, հատկապես ժամանակից կախված նորությունների գնահատականների հետ: Հատկապես, մենք ձևավորում ենք նորությունների գնահատականները համեմատելով յուրաքանչյուր ծրագիր միլիոնավոր արվեստների հետ օգտագործելով արդյունավետ ֆիլտրերի և նեյրոնային երկկոդերի հիբրիդ: Ավելին, մենք պարտադրում ենք նոր վերահսկողական տերմին դասակարգման օբյեկտիվի մեջ, որպեսզի կատարենք հավասարման կանխատեսման մոնատոնիկ փոփոխությունը, և դա նորությունների գնահատականներ է: Մեծ մասամբ USPՏՕ տվյալների համակարգի էքսպանսիվ փորձարկումներից մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ստանդարտ BERT լավագույնը կարող է մասամբ սովորել նորությունների և անհամապատասխանատու տվյալների միջև ճիշտ հարաբերությունները: Այնուամենայնիվ, մեր ժամանակից կախված նորարարության առանձնահատկությունները դրա վրա շարժում են: Ավելին, մեր մոնոտոնիկ ռեգուլարիզացիան, մինչ փոքրանում է որոնման տարածքը, կարող է օպտիզացիչը շարժել ավելի լավ տեղական օպտիմա, որն ավելի փոքր արդյունավետություն է բերում:', 'az': 'Patent uyğulamasının təsdiqlənməsi mümkün olması çoxlu yüzlərdə olan çətin bir problemdir. Ən çox möcüzlü üz yenilənməkdir --- \\emph{35 U.S. kodu 102} əvvəlki sanat sahibi daha yeni proqramları reddedir. Bütün yeni tərzim tərzimlərin bənzər yazma modellərini paylaşır. Ancaq çox yeni proqramlar tərəfli etiketi alır, böylece standart dökümət klasifikatorları (bənzər BERT). Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün yeni bir framework ü təklif edirik \\bizim, əl yaratdığı xüsusiyyətlər ilə, xüsusilə vaxt bağlı yeni nöqtələrlə birləşdirir. Özellikle, hər uyğulama milyonlarla əvvəlki sanatlar ilə hibrid faydalı filtrlər və nöral bi-koder vasitəsilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Daha sonra, biz klasifikasiya məqsədilə yeni düzgünlük terminini, qüvvətli t əsdiqləmə müəyyən edilməsini təsdiqləmək üçün yeni düzgünlük məqsədilə yerləşdiririk. Büyük ölçüdə USPTO veri qutusundakı çox təcrübələrdən standart BERT fine-tuning olaraq yenilik və təcrübələrin arasındakı düzgün ilişki öyrənə bilər. Lakin, zamanımız bağlı yeni xüsusiyyətlərimiz üstündə bir artırma təklif edir. Ayrıca, gözləmə alanını azaltırkən, monotonik düzgünlüyümüz daha yaxşı yerli optimizə sürükləyə bilər, daha kiçik performans faydasını verər.', 'bn': 'একটি প্যাটেন্ট অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের অনুমোদন প্রস্তুতি প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে বেশ কয়েকটি চ্যালেঞ্জার সমস্যা। সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মুখোমুখি হচ্ছে যুক্তি যুক্তি- এমপি {৩৫ মার্কিন কোড ১০২} সাম্প্রতিক অ্যাপলিকেশনের প্রতি অস্বীকার করে যা সাধারণ নথি বিভাগ থেকে প্যাটেন্ট অনুমোদনের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী বিভিন্ন - সফল প্যাটেন্ট অ্যাপ্লিকেশন একই ধরনের লেখা প্যাটেন্ট প however, too-similar newer applications would receive the opposite label, thus confusing standard document classifiers (e.g., BERT).  এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি নভেল ফ্রেম্যাকার্ক প্রস্তাব করি \\যা নথি বিশেষ করে হাতে বিশেষ করে সময়-নির্ভর করে উপস্থিতি স্কোর দিয়ে নথ বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রত্যেক অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের সাথে মিলিয়ন শিল্পের সাথে তুলনা করে বর্ণনার স্কোর তৈরি করি কার্যকর ফিল্টার এবং নিউরেল বি এনকোডার ব এছাড়াও, আমরা শ্রেণীবিভাগের উদ্দেশ্যে একটি নতুন নিয়মিত মেয়াদ বাধ্য করি যাতে অনুমোদনের প্রতি অনুমোদন প্রকাশ করার জন্য। বিশাল পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা থেকে আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে স্ট্যান্ডার্ড বিবের্টের সুনির্দিষ্ট সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে ভাগ্যভাবে উপস্থিত ত তবে আমাদের সময়-নির্ভর করে নির্ভর করা উপস্থিতির বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য তার উপরে বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের মোনোটোনিক নিয়মিত নিয়ন্ত্রণ, যখন অনুসন্ধানের স্থানীয় স্থানীয় অপেক্ষার ক্ষেত্রে কমে যেতে পারে, তখন আরো ছোট একটা প', 'ca': "Predir l'oportunitat d'aprovar una sol·licitat de patent és un problem a desafiant que implica múltiples aspectes. L'aspecte més crucial és probablement la novetat --- \\emph{35 Code U.S. 102} rebutja aplicacions més recents que tenen arts anteriors molt similars. Aquestes avaluacions de novetat difereixen la predicció de l'homologació de la patent de la classificació convencional de documentos -- Les aplicacions de patents èxites poden compartir patrons d'escriptura semblants; però les aplicacions més noves massa semblants rebrien l'etiqueta oposa, i així confondrien els classificadors de documents estàndard (per exemple BERT). Per abordar aquesta qüestió, proposem un nou marc que unifique el classificador de documentos amb característiques artificials, especialment puntuacions de novetat dependents del temps. Concretament, formulem les puntuacions noves comparant cada aplicació amb milions d'arts anteriors utilitzant un híbrid de filtres eficients i un bicodificador neural. A més, imposem un nou terme de regularizació en l'objectiu de classificació per aplicar el canvi monotònic de predicció d'aprobació puntuacions noves. Des d'experiments extensos en un conjunt de dades USPTO a gran escala, trobem que l'ajustament standard BERT pot aprendre en part la relació correcta entre la novetat i l'aprobació a partir de dades inconsistents. Tot i així, les nostres característiques de novetat que depenen del temps ofereixen un impuls. També, la nostra regularització monotònica, mentre redueix l'espai de cerca, pot portar l'optimitzador a millors optims locals, produint un altre petit guany de rendiment.", 'sw': 'Kujiandaa fursa ya ruhusa ya maombi ya patati ni tatizo linalohusisha facebook kadhaa. Kosa la muhimu zaidi ni la riwaya --\\nafasi ya Sheria ya Marekani ya 102} inakanusha matumizi ya hivi karibuni yanayofanana na sanaa za zamani. Tathmini hizo za riwaya zinatofautiana na utabiri wa ruhusa ya patati kutoka katika kutangazwa kwa nyaraka za kawaida --- matumizi yenye mafanikio yanaweza kusambaza mifano yanayofanana na kuandika; Hata hivyo, matumizi mapya yanayofanana na hayo yanaweza kupokea alama tofauti, kwa hiyo yanachanganya maafisa wa nyaraka za kawaida (kama vile BERT). Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa riwaya \\ambao unaunganisha mwandishi wa nyaraka na vipengele vya mikononi, hususani vipengele vya riwaya yanavyotegemea muda. Kwa ujumla, tunatengeneza vipimo vya riwaya kwa kuunganisha kila matumizi yenye mamilioni ya sanaa zilizopita kwa kutumia huduma ya vifaa vyenye ufanisi na kodi ya neura. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaweka muhula mpya w a sheria katika lengo la kutangaza ili kutekeleza mabadiliko ya ubaguzi wa kimapenzi ya kutabiri kama vile vipengele vya hivi karibuni. Kutokana na majaribio makubwa kwenye seti ya data yenye kiasi kikubwa ya USPTO, tunagundua kuwa ujumbe wa usawa wa kawaida wa BERT unaweza kujifunza uhusiano sahihi kati ya riwaya na ruhusa kutoka kwenye taarifa zisizo na usawa. Hata hivyo, taswira zetu za riwaya zinazotegemea muda wetu zinatoa ongezeko hilo juu. Also, our monotonic regularization, while shrinking the search space, can drive the optimizer to better local optima, yielding a further small performance gain.', 'cs': 'Předpověď šance na schválení patentové přihlášky je náročným problémem, který se týká mnoha aspektů. Nejdůležitějším aspektem je pravděpodobně novinka --- \\emph{35 US Code s 102} odmítá novější žádosti, které mají velmi podobné předchozí umění. Tato hodnocení novosti se liší predikcí schválení patentu od klasifikace konvenčních dokumentů --- Úspěšné patentové přihlášky mohou sdílet podobné vzory psaní; Nicméně příliš podobné novější aplikace by dostaly opačný název, což by zaměnilo standardní klasifikátory dokumentů (např. BERT). Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme nový rámec \\our, který sjednocuje klasifikátor dokumentů s ručně vytvořenými funkcemi, zejména časově závislými skóremi novosti. Konkrétně formulujeme skóre novosti porovnáním jednotlivých aplikací s miliony předchozích umění pomocí hybridu efektivních filtrů a neuronového bi-kodéru. Navíc do klasifikačního cíle vkládáme nový regularizační termín, abychom prosadili monotonickou změnu predikce schválení w.r.t. novostní skóre. Z rozsáhlých experimentů na rozsáhlém datovém souboru USPTO zjišťujeme, že standardní jemné ladění BERT může částečně naučit správný vztah mezi novostí a schválením z nekonzistentních dat. Nicméně naše časově závislé novinky nabízejí navíc podporu. Také naše monotonická regularizace, zatímco zmenšuje prostor pro vyhledávání, může optimalizátor přivést k lepšímu lokálnímu optimálu, což přináší další malý zisk výkonu.', 'bs': 'Predviđanje mogućnosti odobrenja patenata je izazovni problem uključujući više lica. Najvažnije lice je navodno novac --- \\emph{35 U.S. kodeks 102} odbacuje nedavne aplikacije koje imaju vrlo slične prethodne umjetnosti. Takve procjene novosti razlikuju predviđanje odobrenja patenata iz klasifikacije konvencionalnog dokumenta --- Uspješne aplikacije patenata mogu podijeliti slične obrasce pisanja; međutim, previše slične nove aplikacije bi primile suprotnu etiketu, tako zbunjujući standardne klasifikatore dokumenta (npr. BERT). Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predlažemo nov okvir \\naš koji ujedinjava klasifikatora dokumenta sa rukopisanim karakteristikama, posebno rezultati novosti ovisnosti o vremenu. Posebno, formuliramo rezultate novosti uspoređujući svaku aplikaciju sa milijunima prethodnih umjetnosti koristeći hibrid efikasnih filtara i neuralnog bi-kodera. Osim toga, stavljamo novi izraz regularizacije u cilj klasifikacije da se primjenjuje monotonska promjena predviđanja odobrenja u novim rezultatima. Iz širokih eksperimenata na velikoj USPTO-ovoj seti podataka, nalazimo se da standardna finalizacija BERT djelomično može naučiti ispravnu vezu između novosti i odobrenja iz nepristojnih podataka. Međutim, naši novi karakteristici ovisnosti o vremenu nude pojačanje na vrhu toga. Također, naša monotonska regularizacija, dok smanjuje prostor pretraživanja, može dovesti optimizatora do bolje lokalne optime, pružajući daljnji mali dobitak učinka.', 'et': 'Patenditaotluse heakskiitmise võimaluse prognoosimine on keeruline probleem, mis hõlmab mitut aspekti. Kõige olulisem aspekt on vaieldamatult uuendus ---\\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} lükkab tagasi hilisemad taotlused, millel on väga sarnased varasemad kunstid. Sellised uuenduste hindamised erinevad patendikinnituse prognoosist tavapärasest dokumendiklassifikatsioonist --- edukatel patenditaotlustel võib olla sarnased kirjamustrid; Kuid liiga sarnased uuemad rakendused saaksid vastupidise märgise, mistõttu standardsed dokumendiklassifikaatorid (nt BERT) segadusse ajavad. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja uudse raamistiku \\our, mis ühendab dokumendiklassifikaatori käsitööna valmistatud funktsioonidega, eriti ajast sõltuvate uudsuste skooridega. Täpsemalt sõnastame uudsuse skoorid, võrreldes iga rakendust miljonite varasemate kunstidega, kasutades tõhusate filtrite hübriidi ja neuraalse bi-kodeerijat. Lisaks kehtestame klassifitseerimiseesmärgile uue regulatsiooni termini, et jõustada heakskiidu prognoosi monotooniline muutus uute skooridega. Laiaulatuslike USPTO andmekogumitega tehtud eksperimentide põhjal leiame, et standardne BERT peenhäälestus võib osaliselt õppida õiget seost uudsuse ja kinnituste vahel ebajärjekindlate andmete põhjal. Kuid meie ajast sõltuvad uuendusfunktsioonid pakuvad lisaks sellele hoogu. Samuti võib meie monotooniline regulariseerimine, vähendades samal ajal otsinguruumi, viia optimeerija parema kohaliku optima juurde, andes veel väikese jõudluse suurenemise.', 'fi': 'Patenttihakemuksen hyv瓣ksymismahdollisuuksien ennustaminen on haastava ja monipuolinen ongelma. Ratkaisevin puoli on kiistatta uutuus ---\\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} hylk瓣瓣 uudemmat hakemukset, joissa on hyvin samanlaisia aikaisempia taiteita. T瓣llaiset uutuusarviot eroavat patenttien hyv瓣ksymisennusteesta tavanomaisesta asiakirjojen luokittelusta --- Hyv瓣ksytyt patenttihakemukset voivat olla samanlaisia kirjoitustapoja; Kuitenkin liian samankaltaiset uudemmat sovellukset saisivat vastakkaisen merkinn瓣n, mik瓣 sekoittaisi standardiluokitukset (esim. BERT). T瓣m瓣n ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta kehyst瓣 \\our, joka yhdist瓣瓣 asiakirjojen luokittelijan k瓣sity繹n瓣 tehtyihin ominaisuuksiin, erityisesti ajasta riippuviin uutuusprosesseihin. Erityisesti muotoilemme uutuusprosenttit vertaamalla jokaista sovellusta miljooniin aikaisempiin taiteisiin k瓣ytt瓣m瓣ll瓣 hybridi瓣 tehokkaita suodattimia ja neurobisenkooderia. Lis瓣ksi asetamme luokittelutavoitteeseen uuden s瓣瓣nn繹stelyn, jolla varmistetaan hyv瓣ksynt瓣ennusteen monotoninen muutos w.r.t. uutuusprosenttien avulla. Laajan USPTO-aineiston laajoista kokeista huomaamme, ett瓣 BERT-standardi hienos瓣瓣t繹 voi osittain oppia oikean suhteen uutuuden ja hyv瓣ksynn瓣n v瓣lill瓣 ep瓣johdonmukaisesta datasta. Aikasidonnaiset uutuusominaisuutemme tarjoavat kuitenkin lis瓣pontta. My繹s monotoninen s瓣瓣nn繹stelymme, samalla kun kutistaa hakutilaa, voi ajaa optimoijan parempaan paikalliseen optimaan, mik瓣 tuottaa viel瓣 pienen suorituskyvyn nousun.', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje možnosti odobritve patentne prijave je zahteven problem, ki vključuje več vidikov. Najpomembnejši vidik je verjetno novost ---\\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} zavrača novejše prijave, ki imajo zelo podobne predhodne umetnosti. Takšne ocene novosti razlikujejo napoved odobritve patenta od klasifikacije dokumentov -- uspešne patentne prijave imajo lahko podobne vzorce pisanja; Vendar pa bi preveč podobne novejše aplikacije dobile nasprotno oznako, kar bi zmedelo standardne klasifikacijske naprave dokumentov (npr. BERT). Za reševanje tega vprašanja predlagamo nov okvir \\our, ki združuje klasifikator dokumentov z ročno izdelanimi funkcijami, zlasti s časovno odvisnimi ocenami novosti. Natančneje, formuliramo rezultate novosti tako, da primerjamo vsako aplikacijo z milijoni predhodnih umetnosti z uporabo hibrida učinkovitih filtrov in nevronskega bi-kodirja. Poleg tega v cilj klasifikacije uveljavljamo nov termin regulacije za uveljavljanje monotonične spremembe napovedi odobritve z rezultati novosti. Iz obsežnih eksperimentov na obsežnem naboru podatkov USPTO ugotavljamo, da lahko standardno natančno nastavitev BERT delno ugotovi pravilno povezavo med novostjo in odobritvami iz nedoslednih podatkov. Vendar pa naše časovno odvisne novosti ponujajo še večjo spodbudo. Prav tako lahko naša monotonična regulacija, medtem ko zmanjšuje iskalni prostor, optimizator poganja k boljši lokalni optimi, kar prinaša dodatno majhno povečanje zmogljivosti.', 'ha': "Predicting the approval chance of a patent application is a challenging problem involving multiple facets.  Babu mafi muhimu fuskar kwamfyuta shine mantin---> Ana ƙidãya wa wannan littafi na rarraba bayani na yardar mazaɓa daga classifori takardar da ɗabi'a - Shiryoyin ayuka masu cin nasara za'a sami tsarin rubũtun; Amma, shirin ayuka masu sauya da kwamfyuta, za'a motsa layuka na motsa, don haka sunã ƙẽtare fassarar takardar aiki (misali, BERT). Domin da za mu yi magana ga wannan masu zartar da, muna goyyade wani firam na nowaya wanda ke sami fassarar takardan, da wasu mistakardar da hannayen da hannayensu, hususann score na-lokaci da ake dõgara. Aka ƙayyade, Muke ƙayyade scori na noveli game da su sami duk shiryoyin ayuka millions na gabanin sananni da ke amfani da kybrid na filteri masu amfani da kwamfyutan bi-kode. Za kuma, za mu ƙayyade wata kalma na t a ƙaitacce zuwa jigon siffarka dõmin mu lazimta musanyin mutane da aka yi bayani na yarda, misali, scori na novelty. Daga jarrabai masu girma a kan tsarin database na YPTO, za'a gane cewa, tunkuɗe mai daidaita BERT na iya amfani da rabon haɗi da tabbatacce tsakanin novelty da yardarsa daga data na da ba'a daidaita ba. Kayya, masu da inganci na riwayanmu da ke ƙara wani kyauta a kanka. Da haka, taƙaitaccen daminiki, idan an ƙara filin search, yana iya iya iya amfani da shi zuwa mafi kyaun shirin lokal, kuma yana ƙara ƙarami ƙarami.", 'he': 'ניזון סיכוי האישור של ביקשת פטנט היא בעיה מאתגרת שכוללת מרובים פנים. הפינקט הכי קריטי הוא כנראה החדשות --- \\emph{35 קוד ארה"ב 102} דחה שימושים אחרונים יותר שיש להם אמנות קודמות מאוד דומות. הערכות חדשות כאלה שונות את חיזוי אישור הפטנט מסווג מסמכים קונבנציונאלי -- ביקשות פטנט מצליחות יכולות לחלוק דפוסים כתיבה דומים; עם זאת, יישומים חדשים יותר דומים מדי יקבלו את התווית ההפך, כך מבלבלים מסמכים סטנדרטיים (למשל BERT). כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים מסגר חדש \\שלנו שייחד את מסמך מסווג עם תכונות מיומנות, במיוחד נקודות חדשות תלויות בזמן. במיוחד, אנו מייצרים את הציונים החדשים על ידי השווה של כל היישום עם מיליוני אמנות קודמות בשימוש היבריד של מסננים יעילים וקודר שני עצבי. חוץ מזה, אנו מכריחים מונח חדש של רפובליזציה לתוך מטרה ההסגרה כדי להכריח את שינוי מונטוני של חיזוי האישור W.r.t. נקודות חדשות. מתוך ניסויים רחבים על קבוצת מידע USPTO בקנה מידה גדולה, אנו מוצאים כי התאמה סטנדרטית BERT יכול ללמוד חלקית את מערכת היחסים הנכונה בין חדשות לאישורים ממידע לא תואם. בכל אופן, תכונות החדשות שלנו תלויים בזמן מציעים דחף על זה. בנוסף, ההתקדמות המונטונית שלנו, בזמן שיפחית את מרחב החיפוש, יכולה להסיע את האופטימיזנטר לאופטימיה מקומית טובה יותר, ומביא תרווית ביצועים קטנה נוספת.', 'jv': 'Ngubah kang kabeh nggunian kanggo aplikasi paten kuwi nggawe perbudhakan kanggo ngilangno karo mulalah sing apik. The world\'s top priority Perintah sing nggawe paling-perintah sing gak bener tentang karo suku kelas nang dokumen sing konnek --- Aplikasi paten sing suku kelas nggawe paling patterns; paling politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ditawak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan iki, kita mudhun perusahaan batir batir Awak dhéwé Laptop" and "Desktop politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging, time-daemongke kuwi nyunganggep kuwi, akeh pengguna kuwi nggawe ngubah. Mungkin, kita sampeyan Monotoni iku, njuk kesalahan kanggo Kebebasan pangan', 'bo': 'patent ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཅིག་གི་ཆོག་འཆན་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་གྱི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡོད་ཚད་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ནི་གདོང The most crucial facet is arguably the novelty --- \\emph{35 U.S. Code s 102} rejects more recent applications that have very similar prior arts. Such novelty evaluations differ from the patent approval prediction from conventional document classification --- Successful patent applications may share similar writing patterns; and ཉེར་སྤྱོད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ལྡོག་མ་དང་ཁ་ཡིག་གེའི་ཁ་ཡིག་ལ་འཛུགས་ཡོད། To address this issue, we propose a novel framework \\our that unifies the document classifier with handcrafted features, particularly time-dependent novelty scores. Specifically, we formulate the novelty scores by comparing each application with millions of prior arts using a hybrid of efficient filters and a neural bi-encoder. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་བཟོས་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་འཇུག་གི་ཡིག་རྟོགས་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་འཇུག་གི་རྒྱུ་ཡི USPTO ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ལས་སྐྱེལ་ཆེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་ ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཅིག་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད ཡིན་ནའང་། དུས་ཚོད་རྟེན་ནས་གསར་གཏོད་ཆེན་དེ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་སྟེ། ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་འཚོལ་བཤེར་བར་སྟོང་ཆུང་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་བ་ནི་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་འདྲི་ཞིབ་དང་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ཆུང་ཀུ་གཏོང་ཚུ'}
{'en': 'Efficient Cluster-Based k-Nearest-Neighbor Machine Translation', 'fr': 'Transformateur Hypergraph {T}\xa0: {W} Raisonnement multi-sauts supervisé rapidement pour une réponse visuelle aux questions basée sur les connaissances', 'es': 'Transformador Hypergraph {T}: {W} Razonamiento multisalto supervisado fácilmente para respuestas visuales a preguntas basadas en el conocimiento', 'pt': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-supervisioned multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge Based Visual Question Answering', 'ar': 'Hypergraph {T} ransformer: {W} المنطق متعدد القفزات الخاضع للإشراف بشكل ضعيف للإجابة على الأسئلة المرئية القائمة على المعرفة', 'ja': 'ハイパーグラフ{T}変換器：知識ベースの視覚的質問回答のための{W} eakly - supervised Multi - Hop Reasoning', 'zh': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'hi': 'हाइपरग्राफ {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'ru': 'Гиперграф {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answing', 'ga': 'Hypergraph {T}claochladán: {W}Réasúnaíocht Il-hop faoi Mhaoirseacht go héasca le haghaidh Amharc-Fhreagraí Bunaithe ar Eolas', 'ka': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'el': 'Υπεργράφος {T}μετασχηματιστής: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Λόγος για οπτική απάντηση ερωτήσεων βασισμένη στη γνώση', 'hu': 'Hypergraph {T}átalakító: {W}egyenletesen felügyelt Multi-hop indokolás a tudásalapú vizuális kérdések megválaszolására', 'it': 'Hypergraph {T}Transformer: {W}Ragionamento multi-hop supervisionato per la risposta alle domande visive basate sulla conoscenza', 'kk': 'Hypergraph {T} трансформаторы: {W} ехниялық басқару көптеген білім негізінде көрінетін сұрақ жауап беру себебі', 'mk': 'Хиперграф {T}трансформер: {W}слушно надгледувано мултихоп причина за одговор на визуелни прашања базиран на знаење', 'lt': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'ms': 'Hypergraph {T}transformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-Hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'mn': 'Хиперграф {T}трансформатчид: {W}eakly-controlled Multi-hop Knowledge-based Visual Question Response', 'ml': 'ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dഗ്രാഫ് റാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d: {W} പരിജ്ഞാനം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ കാഴ്ച ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മറുപടി', 'mt': 'Trasformer tal-ipergrafu {T}', 'no': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W} eakly-supervised multihop Reasoning for kunnskapsbasert visuell spørsmål', 'pl': 'Hypergraph {T}transformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Rozumowanie wizualnego odpowiedzi na pytania oparte na wiedzy', 'ro': 'Hypergraph {T} transformator: {W}supravegheat în mod evident Multi-hop Motivare pentru răspunsul la întrebări vizuale bazate pe cunoaștere', 'sr': 'Hipergraf {T} ransformer: {W} višegodišnje nadzirano višehopsko razlog za odgovor na vizuelno pitanje na znanju', 'si': 'Hypergraph {T} transformer: {W}early-supervised Multi-Hop Reasoning for KnowKnowKnown-based Visal Query Answer', 'so': 'Hypergraph {T} ransformer: {W} eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Ready for Knowledge-based Question Visual Questions', 'sv': 'Hypergraph {T} transformer: {W}oakly-övervakad Multi-hop resonemang för kunskapsbaserat visuellt frågesvar', 'ta': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'ur': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'vi': 'Siêu âm (T) Trả lời câu hỏi Hình thức dựa trên tri thức', 'uz': 'Hypergraph', 'bg': 'Хиперграф {T}трансформър: {W}с контролиран мулти-хоп мотив за отговор на визуални въпроси, базирани на знанието', 'nl': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformator: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-hop Redenen voor op kennis gebaseerde visuele vragen beantwoorden', 'da': 'Hypergraph {T}transformer: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-hop Årsag til videnbaseret visuelt spørgsmål besvarelse', 'hr': 'Hypergraph {T} ransformer: {W} višegodišnje nadzirano višeHopsko razlog za odgovor na vizuelno pitanje na temelju znanja', 'de': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-Hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Beantwortung', 'ko': '하이퍼텍스트 {T} 변환기: {W} 지식 기반의 시각 문답의 약한 감독 다중 점프 추리', 'fa': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'sw': 'Hypergraph {T} ransformer: {W} kwa mara ya kwanza-Supervised Multi-hop Ready for Question Visual Questions based on Knowledge', 'tr': 'Hipergraf {T}terjimeçi: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Bilim tabanly Görsel Sorag Cevap', 'af': 'Hypergraph {T} verskaffer: {W} eakly- Supervised Multi-Hop Reasoning vir kennis-gebaseerde Visuele Fraag Antwoord', 'sq': 'Hypergraph {T}transformer: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-Hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'am': 'transformer', 'hy': 'Հիպերգրաֆ', 'az': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Response', 'bn': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'bs': 'Hypergraph {T} ransformer: {W} višegodišnje nadzirano višehopsko razlog odgovora na vizuelno pitanje na znanju', 'ca': 'Hypergraph {T}transformer: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-Hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering', 'cs': 'Hypergraf {T}transformer: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-hop Odůvodnění pro vizuální zodpovězení otázek založené na znalostech', 'id': 'Hypergraph {T}transformer: {W}eakly-supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answer', 'et': 'Hüpergraaf {T}transformer: {W}eakly- järelevalvega mitme hüppega põhjendus teadmistepõhiseks visuaalseks küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Hypergraph {T}transformaattori: {W}eakly-valvottu monihyppy-perustelu tietopohjaiseen visuaaliseen kyselyvastaukseen', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello worldkey echo', 'ha': 'Hypergraph', 'he': 'העברת היפרגרף:', 'sk': 'Hipergraf {T}transformator: {W}eakly-nadzorovan več-hop razlog za odgovor na vizualna vprašanja, ki temelji na znanju', 'bo': 'Hypergraph {T}ransformer: {W}eakly-Supervised Multi-hop Reasoning for Knowledge-based Visual Question Answering'}
{'en': '\n        k-Nearest-Neighbor Machine Translation (kNN-MT) has been recently proposed as a non-parametric solution for domain adaptation in neural machine translation (NMT). It aims to alleviate the performance degradation of advanced MT systems in translating out-of-domain sentences by coordinating with an additional token-level feature-based retrieval module constructed from in-domain data. Previous studies (Khandelwal et al., 2021; Zheng et al., 2021) have already demonstrated that non-parametric NMT is even superior to models fine-tuned on out-of-domain data. In spite of this success, kNN retrieval is at the expense of high latency, in particular for large datastores. To make it practical, in this paper, we explore a more efficient kNN-MT and propose to use clustering to improve the retrieval efficiency. Concretely, we first propose a cluster-based Compact Network for feature reduction in a contrastive learning manner to compress context features into 90+% lower dimensional vectors. We then suggest a cluster-based pruning solution to filter out 10% 40% redundant nodes in large datastores while retaining translation quality. Our proposed methods achieve better or comparable performance while reducing up to 57% inference latency against the advanced non-parametric MT model on several machine translation benchmarks. Experimental results indicate that the proposed methods maintain the most useful information of the original datastore and the Compact Network shows good generalization on unseen domains. Codes are available at https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/PCKMT.', 'ar': 'تهدف الإجابة عن الأسئلة المرئية القائمة على المعرفة (QA) إلى الإجابة على سؤال يتطلب معرفة خارجية ذات أرضية بصرية تتجاوز محتوى الصورة نفسه. تعتبر الإجابة على الأسئلة المعقدة التي تتطلب تفكيرًا متعدد القفزات تحت إشراف ضعيف مشكلة صعبة نظرًا لأن 1) لا يتم الإشراف على عملية التفكير و 2) يجب التقاط دلالات عالية المستوى لحقائق المعرفة متعددة القفزات. في هذا البحث ، نقدم مفهوم الخط الفائق لتشفير دلالات عالية المستوى لسؤال وقاعدة معرفية ، وللتعرف على ارتباطات عالية المستوى بينهما. النموذج المقترح ، Hypergraph Transformer ، يبني رسمًا بيانيًا للسؤال ورسومات تخطيطية معرفية مدركة للاستعلام ، ويستنتج الإجابة عن طريق ترميز الارتباطات بين اثنين من الرسوم البيانية والجمعيات الداخلية في كل من hypergraphs نفسه. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على اثنين من ضمان الجودة المرئي المستند إلى المعرفة واثنتين من التجارب النصية القائمة على المعرفة فعالية طريقتنا ، خاصةً بالنسبة لمشكلة التفكير متعدد القفزات. كود المصدر الخاص بنا متاح على https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'es': 'La respuesta visual a preguntas (QA) basada en el conocimiento tiene como objetivo responder a una pregunta que requiere un conocimiento externo con base visual más allá del contenido de la imagen en sí. Responder a preguntas complejas que requieren un razonamiento de múltiples saltos bajo una supervisión débil se considera un problema desafiante, ya que i) no se supervisa el proceso de razonamiento y ii) es necesario capturar la semántica de alto orden de los hechos de conocimiento de múltiples saltos. En este artículo, presentamos un concepto de hipergrafía para codificar la semántica de alto nivel de una pregunta y una base de conocimientos, y para aprender asociaciones de alto orden entre ellas. El modelo propuesto, Hypergraph Transformer, construye un hipergrafo de preguntas y un hipergrafo de conocimiento sensible a las consultas, e infiere una respuesta codificando interasociaciones entre dos hipergrafos e intraasociaciones en ambos hipergrafos mismos. Experimentos exhaustivos en dos controles de calidad visuales basados en el conocimiento y dos controles de calidad textuales basados en el conocimiento demuestran la eficacia de nuestro método, especialmente para problemas de razonamiento de múltiples saltos. Nuestro código fuente está disponible en https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'pt': 'A resposta visual a perguntas (QA) baseada em conhecimento visa responder a uma pergunta que requer conhecimento externo visualmente fundamentado além do próprio conteúdo da imagem. Responder a perguntas complexas que requerem raciocínio multi-hop sob supervisão fraca é considerado um problema desafiador, pois i) nenhuma supervisão é dada ao processo de raciocínio e ii) semântica de alta ordem de fatos de conhecimento multi-hop precisam ser capturados. Neste artigo, apresentamos um conceito de hipergrafo para codificar a semântica de alto nível de uma pergunta e uma base de conhecimento e aprender associações de alto nível entre eles. O modelo proposto, Hypergraph Transformer, constrói um hipergrafo de pergunta e um hipergrafo de conhecimento com reconhecimento de consulta, e infere uma resposta codificando interassociações entre dois hipergrafos e intraassociações em ambos os hipergrafos propriamente ditos. Extensos experimentos em dois QA visual baseado em conhecimento e dois QA textual baseado em conhecimento demonstram a eficácia do nosso método, especialmente para problemas de raciocínio multi-hop. Nosso código-fonte está disponível em https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'fr': "La réponse visuelle aux questions (AQ) basée sur les connaissances vise à répondre à une question qui nécessite des connaissances externes visuellement ancrées au-delà du contenu de l'image lui-même. Répondre à des questions complexes qui nécessitent un raisonnement multi-sauts sous faible supervision est considéré comme un problème difficile car i) aucune supervision n'est donnée au processus de raisonnement et ii) une sémantique d'ordre élevé des faits de connaissances multi-sauts doit être capturée. Dans cet article, nous introduisons un concept d'hypergraphe pour coder la sémantique de haut niveau d'une question et d'une base de connaissances, et pour apprendre les associations d'ordre élevé entre elles. Le modèle proposé, Hypergraph Transformer, construit un hypergraphe de questions et un hypergraphe de connaissances prenant en compte les requêtes, et déduit une réponse en codant les associations entre deux hypergraphes et les associations intra-associées dans les deux hypergraphes eux-mêmes. Des expériences approfondies sur deux QA visuels basés sur les connaissances et deux AQ textuels basés sur les connaissances démontrent l'efficacité de notre méthode, en particulier pour les problèmes de raisonnement multi-sauts. Notre code source est disponible sur https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.", 'hi': 'ज्ञान-आधारित दृश्य प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) का उद्देश्य एक ऐसे प्रश्न का उत्तर देना है जिसके लिए छवि सामग्री से परे नेत्रहीन-आधारित बाहरी ज्ञान की आवश्यकता होती है। कमजोर पर्यवेक्षण के तहत मल्टी-हॉप तर्क की आवश्यकता वाले जटिल प्रश्नों का उत्तर देना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या के रूप में माना जाता है क्योंकि i) तर्क प्रक्रिया को कोई पर्यवेक्षण नहीं दिया जाता है और ii) मल्टी-हॉप ज्ञान तथ्यों के उच्च-क्रम के शब्दार्थ पर कब्जा करने की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम एक प्रश्न और ज्ञान के आधार के उच्च-स्तरीय शब्दार्थ को एन्कोड करने के लिए हाइपरग्राफ की एक अवधारणा पेश करते हैं, और उनके बीच उच्च-क्रम के संघों को सीखने के लिए। प्रस्तावित मॉडल, हाइपरग्राफ ट्रांसफॉर्मर, एक प्रश्न हाइपरग्राफ और एक क्वेरी-जागरूक ज्ञान हाइपरग्राफ का निर्माण करता है, और हाइपरग्राफ दोनों में दो हाइपरग्राफ और इंट्रा-एसोसिएशनों के बीच अंतर-संघों को एन्कोडिंग करके एक उत्तर का अनुमान लगाता है। दो ज्ञान-आधारित दृश्य क्यूए और दो ज्ञान-आधारित पाठ्य क्यूए पर व्यापक प्रयोग हमारी विधि की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, विशेष रूप से बहु-हॉप तर्क समस्या के लिए। हमारा स्रोत कोड https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの視覚的質問回答（ QA ）は、イメージコンテンツそのものを超えて視覚的に対外的な知識を必要とする質問に答えることを目的としている。 弱い監督下でマルチホップ推論を必要とする複雑な質問に答えることは、i ）推論プロセスに監督が与えられておらず、ii ）マルチホップ知識事実の高次の意味論を取り込む必要があるため、困難な問題と考えられる。 本稿では、質問と知識ベースのハイレベルな意味論を符号化し、それらの間の高次の関連付けを学習するためのハイパーグラフの概念を紹介する。 提案されているモデルであるハイパーグラフ変換は、質問ハイパーグラフとクエリ認識知識ハイパーグラフを構築し、２つのハイパーグラフ間の関連付けとハイパーグラフ自体の関連付けを符号化することによって答えを推論する。 2つの知識ベースの視覚的QAと2つの知識ベースのテキストQAの広範な実験は、特にマルチホップ推論問題に対する当社の方法の有効性を示しています。 ソースコードはhttps://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-publicから入手できます。', 'ru': 'Ответ на визуальный вопрос, основанный на знаниях (QA), направлен на то, чтобы ответить на вопрос, который требует визуально обоснованных внешних знаний, помимо самого содержания изображения. Ответы на сложные вопросы, требующие многохоповых рассуждений под слабым надзором, рассматриваются как сложная проблема, поскольку i) процесс рассуждений не контролируется и ii) необходимо фиксировать факты о многохоповых знаниях высокого порядка. В данной работе мы вводим понятие гиперграфа для кодирования высокоуровневой семантики вопроса и базы знаний, а также для изучения ассоциаций высокого порядка между ними. Предложенная модель, Hypergraph Transformer, строит гиперграф вопросов и гиперграф знаний, основанный на запросах, и выводит ответ, кодируя межассоциации между двумя гиперграфами и внутриассоциации в самом гиперграфе. Обширные эксперименты над двумя основанными на знаниях визуальными QA и двумя основанными на знаниях текстовыми QA демонстрируют эффективность нашего метода, особенно для проблемы многохопового мышления. Наш исходный код доступен по адресу https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'zh': '盖知识之视答(QA)指答一问,须越象体之视基外知。 弱监下对以多重推理为一挑战性,i)不督于理,ii)得多跳知之高阶语义也。 本文引超图之名,编码于知识库之高语义,而习其高阶。 所发超图转换器模造一问超图与一问知超图,因编码两超图之间超图两超图内关以推之。 夫两视 QA 两本 QA 博实验证吾术之有效性,尤多推理。 吾源代码可 https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public。', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag freagairt ceisteanna amhairc eolas-bhunaithe (QA) ceist a fhreagairt a éilíonn eolas seachtrach atá bunaithe ar fhís seachas ábhar na híomhá féin. Meastar gur fadhb dhúshlánach í ceisteanna casta a fhreagairt a éilíonn réasúnaíocht il-hop faoi mhaoirseacht lag mar i) nach dtugtar aon mhaoirseacht ar an bpróiseas réasúnaíochta agus ii) ní mór faisnéis a fháil ar shéimeantacht ard-ord na bhfíoras il-hop. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach coincheap hipeargraf chun séimeantaic ardleibhéil de cheist agus de bhunachar eolais a ionchódú, agus chun cumainn ard-ord a fhoghlaim eatarthu. Tógann an tsamhail mholta, Hypergraph Transformer, hipeargraf ceiste agus hipeargraf eolais feasach ar cheisteanna, agus tátal a bhaint as freagra trí idir-chomhcheangail a ionchódú idir dhá hipeargraf agus laistigh de chomhlachais sa dá hipeargraf féin. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar dhá QA amhairc eolas-bhunaithe agus dhá QA téacs eolas-bhunaithe éifeachtacht ár modh, go háirithe le haghaidh il-hop fhadhb réasúnaíocht. Tá ár gcód foinse ar fáil ag https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'el': 'Η οπτική απάντηση ερωτήσεων με βάση τη γνώση έχει ως στόχο να απαντήσει σε μια ερώτηση που απαιτεί οπτικά τεκμηριωμένη εξωτερική γνώση πέρα από το ίδιο το περιεχόμενο εικόνας. Η απάντηση σε πολύπλοκες ερωτήσεις που απαιτούν συλλογισμό πολλαπλών λυκίδων υπό αδύναμη εποπτεία θεωρείται προκλητικό πρόβλημα δεδομένου ότι i) δεν παρέχεται εποπτεία στη διαδικασία συλλογισμού και ii) πρέπει να συλληφθεί σημασιολογία υψηλής τάξης των γεγονότων γνώσης πολλών λυκίδων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε μια έννοια του υπεργράφου για να κωδικοποιήσουμε τη σημασιολογία υψηλού επιπέδου μιας ερώτησης και μιας βάσης γνώσης, και να μάθουμε συσχετισμούς υψηλής τάξης μεταξύ τους. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο, ο Μεταμορφωτής Υπεργραφής, κατασκευάζει έναν υπεργράφο ερωτήσεων και έναν υπεργράφο γνώσης με επίγνωση ερωτήματος, και συμπεραίνει μια απάντηση κωδικοποιώντας τις διασυνδέσεις μεταξύ δύο υπεργραφών και ενδοσυσχετισμών και στον ίδιο τον υπεργράφο. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε δύο βασισμένες στη γνώση οπτικές QA και δύο βασισμένες στη γνώση γραπτές QA καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου μας, ειδικά για το πρόβλημα συλλογισμού πολλαπλών λυκίδων. Ο πηγαίος μας κώδικας είναι διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'hu': 'A tudásalapú vizuális kérdésre adott válasz (QA) célja, hogy megválaszoljon egy olyan kérdésre, amely vizuálisan alapozott külső tudást igényel magán a kép tartalmán túl. A gyenge felügyelet mellett több-hop érvelést igénylő komplex kérdések megválaszolása kihívást jelentő problémának tekinthető, mivel i) az érvelési folyamat nem felügyelete, és ii) a multi-hop tudástények magas rendű szemantikáját kell rögzíteni. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a hipergráf fogalmát, amely egy kérdés és egy tudásbázis magas szintű szemantikájának kódolására, valamint a közöttük lévő magas rendű asszociációk tanulására szolgál. A javasolt modell, a Hypergraph Transformer, egy kérdés hipergráfot és egy lekérdezés-tudatos tudás hipergráfot épít fel, és a választ úgy következteti, hogy kódolja a két hipergráfot és az intra-asszociációt magában a hipergráfot. Két tudásalapú vizuális minősítésen és két tudásalapú szöveges minősítésen végzett kiterjedt kísérletek bizonyítják módszerünk hatékonyságát, különösen a multi-hop érvelési problémák esetén. A forráskódunk elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ka': 'Name კომპლექსიკური კითხვების შესაძლებლობა, რომლებიც უნდა მრავალ-ჰოპური პარამენტიკური გასაკეთება ძალიან მონაცემების ქვემოთ, იფიქრობენ როგორც შესაძლებელი პრობლემა, რადგან i) არაფერი მონაცემებ ამ კონფიგურში ჩვენ ჰიპერგრაფის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციას ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ, რომ კითხვის და ცნობიერების სემონტიკის კონფიგურაციას კონფიგურაციას და მათგან მეტი პროგრამის მოდელი, ჰიპერგრაფის ტრანფორმაცია, კითხვის ჰიპერგრაფის და კითხვის უცნობის ჰიპერგრაფის კონფიგურაციას კონფიგურაციას, და ორი ჰიპერგრაფის შორის კონფიგურაციების გამოსახულებას დააკეთება გაფართლებული ექსპერიმენტები ორი მეცნიერების გარეშე ვიზუალური QA და ორი მეცნიერების გარეშე ტექსტულ QA-ს გამოჩვენება ჩვენი მეცნიერების ეფექტიურობა, განსაკუთრებით მრა ჩვენი წიგნის კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'it': "La risposta visiva basata sulla conoscenza (QA) mira a rispondere a una domanda che richiede una conoscenza esterna basata sulla conoscenza visiva oltre il contenuto dell'immagine stessa. Rispondere a domande complesse che richiedono ragionamenti multi-hop sotto una supervisione debole è considerato un problema impegnativo poiché i) non è data alcuna supervisione al processo di ragionamento e ii) la semantica di alto ordine dei fatti di conoscenza multi-hop deve essere catturata. In questo articolo, introduciamo un concetto di ipergrafo per codificare la semantica di alto livello di una domanda e di una base di conoscenza, e per imparare le associazioni di alto ordine tra di loro. Il modello proposto, Hypergraph Transformer, costruisce un hypergrafo di domanda e un hypergrafo di conoscenza consapevole delle query, e deduce una risposta codificando le inter-associazioni tra due hypergrafi e intra-associazioni in entrambi gli hypergrafi stessi. Esperimenti approfonditi su due QA visivi basati sulla conoscenza e due QA testuali basati sulla conoscenza dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro metodo, specialmente per il problema del ragionamento multi-hop. Il nostro codice sorgente è disponibile all'indirizzo https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.", 'lt': 'Knowledge-based visual question answering (QA) aims to answer a question which requires visually-grounded external knowledge beyond image content itself.  Atsakymai į sudėtingus klausimus, kuriems reikalingas kelių apynių motyvavimas, esant silpnei prieži ūrai, laikomi sudėtinga problem a, nes i) motyvavimo procesas nėra prižiūrimas ir ii) reikia atsižvelgti į aukštos tvarkos daugiapynių žinių faktų semantiką. Šiame dokumente mes įvedame hipergrafijos koncepciją, koduojančią aukšto lygio klausimo semantiką ir žinių bazę, ir mokytis aukšto lygio asociacijų tarp jų. Siūlomas modelis Hypergraph Transformer sukuria klausimų hipergrafą ir klausimus žinomą žinių hipergrafą ir nustato atsakymą koduojant dviejų hipergrafų ir pačios hipergrafo sąsajas. Išsamūs eksperimentai su dviem žiniomis pagrįstais vizualiniais QA ir dviem žiniomis pagrįstais tekstiniais QA rodo mūsų metodo veiksmingumą, ypač daugelio apynių motyvavimo problemoms spręsti. Our source code is available at  https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'mk': 'Одговорот на визуелно прашање базирано на знаење (QA) има за цел одговор на прашање кое бара визуелно основано надворешно знаење надвор од содржината на сликата. Одговорите на комплексните прашања кои бараат мултихоп размислување под слаб надзор се сметаат за предизвикувачки проблем бидејќи i) не се дава надзор на процесот на размислување и ii) мора да се зафати семантика на високи редови на фактите за мултихоп знаење. Во овој весник, ние воведуваме концепт на хиперграф за кодирање на семантика на високо ниво на прашање и база на знаење, и за научување на високо-редовни асоцијации меѓу нив. Предложениот модел, Хиперграфски трансформер, конструира хиперграф на прашања и хиперграф на знаење на прашања, и инферира одговор со кодирање на интерасоцијациите помеѓу двете хиперграфии и интерасоцијации во самиот хиперграф. Експериментите на две визуелни QA базирани на знаење и две текстуални QA базирани на знаење ја покажуваат ефикасноста на нашиот метод, особено за проблемот со мултихоп размислување. Нашиот изворен код е достапен на https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'kk': 'Білім негіздеген визуалдық сұрақ (QA) жауап беру мақсаты кескіндің мазмұнынан артық сыртқы білім керек сұрағына жауап беру керек. Көп-хоп тәжірибесінде көпшілікті бақылау керек комплекс сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін i) бақылау процесіне көп-хоп білім факттарының көпшілікті семантикалық сұрақтарды қабылдау керек емес. Бұл қағазда біз гиперграфтың концепциясын бір сұрақ мен білім негізінің жоғары деңгейіндегі семантикалық симантикалық кодтамыз және олардың арасындағы жоғары реттегі қатынастарды үйрену үші Келтірілген үлгі, Хиперграф түрлендіруші, гиперграф және сұраныс білім гиперграфы құрады, және екі гиперграф мен интерграф түрлендірушілері арасындағы кодтамасыз жауап береді. Екі білім негіздеген визуалдық QA және екі білім негіздеген мәтін QA әдісіміздің әдісіміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді, осымен қатар бірнеше хоп тәуелдеу мәселесін көрсе Біздің көзіміздің кодымыз бар https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ms': 'Knowledge-based visual question answering (QA) aims to answer a question which requires visually-grounded external knowledge beyond image content itself.  Jawaban soalan kompleks yang memerlukan alasan berbilang-hop di bawah pengawasan lemah dianggap sebagai masalah yang mencabar kerana i) tiada pengawasan diberikan kepada proses alasan dan ii) semantik tertib tinggi fakta pengetahuan berbilang-hop perlu ditangkap. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan konsep hipergraf untuk mengekodkan semantik tinggi soalan dan pangkalan pengetahuan, dan untuk belajar persekutuan tertib tinggi antara mereka. Model yang diusulkan, Hypergraph Transformer, membina hipergraf soalan dan hipergraf pengetahuan yang sedar soalan, dan menyimpulkan jawapan dengan mengekodkan antara-persatuan antara dua hipergraf dan intra-persatuan dalam kedua-dua hipergraf sendiri. Eksperimen luas pada dua QA visual berdasarkan pengetahuan dan dua QA tekstual berdasarkan pengetahuan menunjukkan kegunaan kaedah kita, terutama untuk masalah pemikiran berbilang-hop. Kod sumber kita tersedia di https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet viżwali bbażati fuq l-għarfien (QA) għandha l-għan li twieġeb għal mistoqsija li teħtieġ għarfien estern viżwali lil hinn mill-kontenut tal-immaġni nnifsu. It-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet kumplessi li jeħtieġu raġunament multi-hop taħt superviżjoni dgħajfa hija kkunsidrata bħala problem a ta’ sfida peress li i) ma tingħata l-ebda superviżjoni lill-proċess ta’ raġunament u ii) hemm bżonn li tinqabad semantika ta’ ordni għolja ta’ fatti ta’ għarfien multi-hop. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu kunċett ta’ ipergrafija biex nikkodifikaw semantika ta’ livell għoli ta’ mistoqsija u bażi ta’ għarfien, u biex nitgħallmu assoċjazzjonijiet ta’ ordni għolja bejniethom. Il-mudell propost, Hypergraph Transformer, jibni ipergrafu tal-mistoqsijiet u ipergrafu tal-għarfien konxju mill-mistoqsijiet, u jikkonkludi risposta billi jikkodifika interassoċjazzjonijiet bejn żewġ ipergrafi u intraassoċjazzjonijiet fiż-żewġ ipergrafi nnifishom. Esperimenti estensivi fuq żewġ QA viżwali bbażati fuq l-għarfien u żewġ QA testwali bbażati fuq l-għarfien juru l-effettività tal-metodu tagħna, speċjalment għall-problema tar-raġunament b’ħafna ħops. Il-kodiċi tas-sors tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ml': 'അറിവ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ കാഴ്ചയുടെ ഉത്തരം (ക്യൂഎ) ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഇമേജിന്റെ ഉള്ള ബലഹോപ്പ് നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത് ദുര്\u200dബലമായ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നമാണെന്നാണ്. എന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dഗ്രാഫിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു ആശയം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഒരു ചോദ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെയും പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെയും സെമാന്റിക്കുകള പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d, ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dഗ്രാഫ് ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d, ഒരു ചോദ്യം ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dഗ്രാഫിനെയും വിവരമുള്ള അറിവ് ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dഗ്രാഫിനെയും നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു.  രണ്ട് അറിവ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ക്യൂഎയുടെയും രണ്ട് വിജ്ഞാനം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d ക്യൂഎയുടെയും വിശേഷ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ പ നമ്മുടെ ഉറവിട കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'no': 'Visuell spørsmål som er basert på kjennomsikt (QA) er målet å svara på eit spørsmål som krev synleg eksternt kunnskap enn innhaldet i biletet sjølv. Svar på komplekse spørsmål som krev fleire hopp-rasjonar under svak oversikt, vert kalla som eit vanskeleg problem sidan i) ingen oversikt vert gitt til rasjonsprosessen og ii) høg rekkefølgje semantikk av fleire hopp-kunnskapsfaktar må henta. I denne papiret introduserer vi ein konsept av hypergraf for å kode høg nivå semantikk av eit spørsmål og ein kunnskapsbasen, og å lære høg rekkefølgje tilknytingar mellom dei. Den foreslåde modellen, Hypergraph Transformer, konstruerer eit spørsmål hypergraph og ein kjenningshypergraph med spørsmål, og innfører ein svar ved koding av inter-associasjonar mellom to hypergraph og intra-associasjonar i begge hypergraph selv. Ekstra eksperimenter på to kunnskapsbaserte visuell QA og to kunnskapsbaserte tekst QA demonstrerer effektiviteten av metoden vårt, spesielt for multihops- rasjonsbruk problem. Kjeldekode vår er tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'pl': 'Oparte na wiedzy wizualne odpowiedzi na pytania (QA) mają na celu odpowiedź na pytanie, które wymaga wizualnie uziemionej wiedzy zewnętrznej poza samą treść obrazu. Odpowiedź na złożone pytania wymagające rozumowania multi-hop pod słabym nadzorem uważa się za problem wymagający, ponieważ i) proces rozumowania nie jest nadzorowany i ii) należy uchwycić wysokiego rzędu semantykę faktów wiedzy multi-hop. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy koncepcję hiperagrafu kodującą semantykę wysokiego poziomu pytania i bazy wiedzy oraz poznającą powiązania między nimi o wysokim rzędzie. Proponowany model, Hypergraph Transformer, konstruuje hipergrafę pytań i hipergrafę wiedzy świadomej zapytania i wnioskuje odpowiedź poprzez kodowanie skojarzeń między dwoma hipergrafami i wewnątrz-skojarzeniami w obu hipergrafach. Obszerne eksperymenty na dwóch opartych na wiedzy wizualnych QA oraz dwóch opartych na wiedzy tekstowych QA demonstrują skuteczność naszej metody, zwłaszcza w przypadku problemów multi-hop rozumowania. Nasz kod źródłowy jest dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн үндсэн хариулт асуулт (QA) нь зураг агуулалтын өөрөөс илүү харагдах гадаад мэдлэг шаардлагатай асуултыг хариулах зорилго юм. Олон холбоотой ойлголтын шаардлагатай олон холбоотой асуултууд хариулт өгөх нь хүчтэй асуудал гэж үздэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид гиперграфын ойлголтыг асуулт, мэдлэг суурь дээр суралцах, тэдний хооронд өндөр дарааллын холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг суралцахын тулд танилцуулдаг. Хиперграф түвшигч нь асуулт гиперграф болон мэдлэг гиперграф болон хоёр гиперграфын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой хариултыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Хоёр мэдлэг дээр суурилсан харагдах QA болон хоёр мэдлэг дээр суурилсан textual QA-ын туршилтууд нь бидний арга замын үр дүнг үзүүлдэг, ялангуяа олон холбоотой бодлого бодох асуудлыг харуулдаг. Бидний эх үүсвэрийн код https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul vizual bazat pe cunoaștere (QA) își propune să răspundă la o întrebare care necesită cunoștințe externe bazate pe bază vizuală dincolo de conținutul imaginii în sine. Răspunsul la întrebări complexe care necesită raționament multi-hop sub supraveghere slabă este considerat o problemă provocatoare, deoarece i) nu este acordată supraveghere procesului de raționament și ii) semantica de ordin înalt a faptelor cunoașterii multi-hop trebuie capturată. În această lucrare, introducem un concept de hipergraf pentru a codifica semantica la nivel înalt a unei întrebări și a unei baze de cunoștințe și pentru a învăța asociații de ordine înaltă între ele. Modelul propus, Hypergraph Transformer, construiește un hipergraf de întrebare și un hipergraf de cunoaștere conștient de interogare și deduce un răspuns prin codificarea inter-asocierilor dintre două hipergrafe și intra-asocieri în ambele hipergrafe în sine. Experimentele extinse pe două QA vizuale bazate pe cunoaștere și două QA textuale bazate pe cunoaștere demonstrează eficiența metodei noastre, în special pentru problema raționamentului multi-hop. Codul nostru sursă este disponibil la https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na vizuelnim pitanjima na znanju (QA) je cilj da odgovori na pitanje koje zahteva vizualno osnovano vanjsko znanje izvan samog sadržaja slika. Odgovor na složena pitanja koje zahtevaju multihopski razgovor pod slabim nadzorom smatra se izazovnim problemom jer i) ne daje nadzor procesu razumljivanja i ii) treba uhvatiti visoke semantike činjenica multihopskih znanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo koncept hipergrafa kako bi kodirali semantike visokog nivoa pitanja i bazu znanja i naučili visokoredne asocijacije između njih. Predloženi model, Hypergraph Transformer, izgradi pitanje hipergrafa i hipergraf znanja koji se ne pitaju, i uvezuje odgovor kodiranjem inter-asocijacija između dva hipergrafa i intra-asocijacija u samom hipergrafu. Eksperimenti na dva vizuelna QA na znanju i dva tekstualna QA na znanju pokazuju učinkovitost našeg metoda, posebno za multihopski problem razumevanja. Naš izvorni kod je dostupan na https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'si': 'Name සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් උත්තර දෙන්න ඕනා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දුර්වල බලන්න අඩුවෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කියලා හිතන්නේ. i) කිසිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  මේ පත්තරේ අපි හායිපර්ග්\u200dරාෆ් ගැන අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ දන්නවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන හොඳ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා  The advised Model, Hypergraph Transferer, constitutes a ask hypergraph and a Query-Known Known Hypergraph, and Infers an Answer by code inter-Association Betwich Hypergraphs and intra-Association in both hypergraph own. විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් QA සහ දැනගන්න පුළුවන් දෙකක් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් QA ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන කෝඩ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තියෙන්නේ. https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'so': "jawaabta su'aalaha aragtida ee aqoonta ku saleysan (QA) waxaa loola jeedaa in uu ka jawaabo su'aal aad u baahan tahay aqoonta dibadda oo aragtida ka baxsan wax ku saabsan sawirka. Iska jawaabta su'aalaha adag oo u baahan ilaalinta badan sabab dhibaato adag, sababtoo ah waa in la qabsado xaaladaha aqoonta badan oo badan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaynaa fekerka sare si aan u koobanno su'aalaha iyo saldhigga aqoonta iyo in aan u barno ururo sare dhexdooda. Tusaale la soo jeeday, Hypergraph Transfer, wuxuu dhisaa sawir dheeraad ah iyo hypergraf aqoonta la yaqaan, wuxuuna ku dhici karaa jawaab si ay u qorto ururo dhexeeya labada hypergraf iyo urur labadooda hypergraf. Imtixaan dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan labada muuqata QA iyo labo qoraal oo aqoonta ah ee QA waxay muujiyaan tayada, khusuusan dhibaatada sababta badan. Qorada asalkayaga waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.", 'sv': 'Kunskapsbaserat visuellt frågesvar (QA) syftar till att besvara en fråga som kräver visuellt grundad extern kunskap bortom själva bildinnehållet. Att besvara komplexa frågor som kräver multi-hop resonemang under svag övervakning anses vara ett utmanande problem eftersom i) ingen övervakning ges till resonemanget och ii) hög ordnings semantik av multi-hop kunskapsfakta behöver fångas. I denna uppsats introducerar vi ett begrepp hypergraf för att koda hög nivå semantik av en fråga och en kunskapsbas, och för att lära sig hög ordning associationer mellan dem. Den föreslagna modellen, Hypergraph Transformer, konstruerar en frågehypergraf och en frågemedveten kunskapshypergraf, och härleder ett svar genom att koda inter-associationer mellan två hypergrafer och intra-associationer i båda hypergraferna själva. Omfattande experiment på två kunskapsbaserade visuella QA och två kunskapsbaserade textbaserade QA visar hur effektiv vår metod är, särskilt för multi-hop resonemang problem. Vår källkod finns tillgänglig på https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பார்வை கேள்வி பதில் (QA) ஒரு கேள்விக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கும், அது பிம்பத்தின் உள்ளடக்கத்தை விட பலஹாப் கண்காணிப்பில் காரணங்கள் தேவைப்படும் சிக்கல் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் கூறுதல் பலஹாப் பிரச்சனையான பிரச்சனையாக கருதப்படுகிறது ஏனென்றால் நான் விஷயமா இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கேள்வி மற்றும் அறிவு அடிப்படையின் உயர்நிலையில் குறியீட்டு அமைப்புகளை குறியீட்டும் ஒரு ஹைப்பர்காப் கர பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி, ஹைப்பர்கார்க் மாற்றி ஒரு கேள்வி ஹைப்பர்காஃப் மற்றும் ஒரு கேள்வி அறிவு தெரியும் அறிவு ஹைப்பர்காஃப் உருவாக்குகிறது, மற்றும் இரண்டு ஹ இரண்டு அறிவு அடிப்படையிலான காட்சி QA மற்றும் இரண்டு அறிவு அடிப்படையான கியூஏ முறையின் விரிவான சோதனைகளை காண்பிக்கிறது, குறிப்பாக பல எங்கள் மூல குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ur': 'علم-based visual question replying (QA) aim is to answer a question which requires visually-grounded external knowledge beyond image content itself. پیچیدہ سوالوں کی جواب دینے کی ضرورت ہے کہ کمزور نظر کے نیچے بہت سے ہپ رابطہ کرنے کی ضرورت رکھتی ہے، اس لئے کہ i) کوئی نظر نظر نظر نظر نہیں آتا اور ii) بہت سے ہپ علم حقیقت کے مطابق اٹھانے کی ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے اہیرگراف کا مطلب معلوم کر دیا ہے کہ ایک سوال اور علم کی بنیاد کے بلند سطح کی سیمانٹیکوں کو اور ان کے درمیان بلند سطح کی تعلقات سکھائے۔ پیشنهاد کی موڈل، ہیپر گراف ترفنسر، ایک سوال اپر گراف اور ایک سوال آگاہ علم اپر گراف بناتا ہے، اور ایک جواب دو ہیپر گراف اور دونوں ہیپر گراف کے درمیان ان انڈیر ترفنس کے ذریعہ ایک جواب دیتا ہے. دو علم بوسیدہ تصویر QA اور دو علم بوسیدہ ٹیکسٹولی QA پر اضافہ کی آزمائش دکھاتی ہیں، مخصوصاً multi-hop reasoning مسئلہ کے لئے. ہمارے سراسر کوڈ موجود ہے https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi hình thức dựa trên kiến thức trả lời (QA) nhằm trả lời một câu hỏi yêu cầu kiến thức bên ngoài hình ảnh. Câu trả lời những câu hỏi phức tạp cần phải suy nghĩ nhiều nhà thờ dưới sự giám sát yếu ớt được xem là một vấn đề thách thức vì i) không được giám sát quá trình lập luận và giây phút quan trọng của sự hiểu biết đa ngành cần được ghi lại. Trong bài báo này, chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu khái niệm sử dụng siêu đồ để mã hóa ngữ pháp cấp cao của một câu hỏi và một căn cứ kiến thức, và để học các liên quan đẳng cao giữa họ. The proposed model, Hypergrapher transformer, construct a question hypograph and a question-knowledge hypograph, and inferis an answer by encomting interactions between two hyperographs and inter-groups in both hyperraph himself. Những thí nghiệm dồi dào về hai kiếm ảnh dựa trên kiến thức và hai kiến văn bản dựa trên kiến thức chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp, đặc biệt cho vấn đề lập trình đa ngành. Mã nguồn của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'uz': "Maʼlumot asosida koʻruvchi savol (QA) javob berish imkoniyatini, rasm tarkibini oʻzgartirish uchun tashqi javob berish kerak. Ko'pchilik soʻzlariga ko'p-hop qo'shimcha sabablar qo'llanmagan murakkab muammolar deb hisoblanadi chunki mening sabablar jarayonini ko'rsatmaydi va i i) bir necha ko'plab-hop ma'lumot haqida o'rganish asoslarini olib tashlash kerak emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz savol va ilmiy asosiy semantika yuqori hypergrafning fikrini ko'rsatumiz va ularning orasidagi yuqori tashkilotlarni o'rganamiz. Name Ikkita ilmiy ko'zlik QA va ikkita ilmiy texnologiya QA asosida katta tajribalarni ko'paytirish mumkinligini ko'rsatadi. Mavjud manba kodi https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.", 'bg': 'Основаният на знанието визуален отговор на въпроси има за цел да отговори на въпрос, който изисква визуално обосновано външно познание отвъд самото съдържание на изображението. Отговарянето на сложни въпроси, които изискват мулти-хоп разсъждения под слаб надзор, се счита за предизвикателен проблем, тъй като i) не се дава надзор на процеса на разсъждения и ii) трябва да бъде уловена семантика от висок ред на мулти-хоп знания факти. В тази статия въвеждаме концепция за хиперграф, за да кодираме семантика на високо ниво на въпрос и база от знания, както и да научим асоциации от висок ред между тях. Предложеният модел, Хиперграфен трансформатор, конструира хиперграф на въпросите и хиперграф на знанието, осъзнаващ запитвания, и извежда отговор чрез кодиране на взаимоасоциации между два хиперграфа и вътреасоциации в самия хиперграф. Обширни експерименти върху два базирани на знанието визуални отговори и два базирани на знанието текстови отговори демонстрират ефективността на нашия метод, особено при мулти-хоп разсъждения проблем. Нашият изходен код е достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'nl': 'Knowledge-based visual question responsing (QA) is bedoeld om een vraag te beantwoorden die visueel gegronde externe kennis vereist naast beeldinhoud zelf. Het beantwoorden van complexe vragen die multi-hop redenering vereisen onder zwak toezicht wordt beschouwd als een uitdagend probleem aangezien i) er geen toezicht wordt gegeven op het redeneringsproces en ii) high-order semantica van multi-hop kennis feiten moeten worden vastgelegd. In dit artikel introduceren we een concept van hypergraaf om semantiek op hoog niveau van een vraag en een kennisbank te coderen, en om associaties tussen hen op hoge orde te leren. Het voorgestelde model, Hypergraph Transformer, construeert een vraaghypergraaf en een query-bewuste kennishypergraaf, en concludeert een antwoord door interassociaties tussen twee hypergrafieken en intra-associaties in beide hypergrafieken zelf te coderen. Uitgebreide experimenten met twee op kennis gebaseerde visuele QA en twee op kennis gebaseerde tekstuele QA tonen de effectiviteit van onze methode aan, vooral voor multi-hop redeneering probleem. Onze broncode is beschikbaar op: https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'da': 'Videnbaseret visuel spørgsmålsbesvarelse (QA) har til formål at besvare et spørgsmål, der kræver visuelt grundlagt ekstern viden ud over selve billedindholdet. Besvarelse af komplekse spørgsmål, der kræver multi-hop ræsonnement under svagt tilsyn, betragtes som et udfordrende problem, da i) der ikke gives overvågning af ræsonnementsprocessen, og ii) høj ordre semantik af multi-hop viden fakta skal indfanges. I denne artikel introducerer vi et begreb hypergrap for at kode højt niveau semantik af et spørgsmål og en vidensbase, og for at lære høj orden associationer mellem dem. Den foreslåede model, Hypergraph Transformer, konstruerer en spørgsmålshypergraf og en forespørgselsbevidst videnshypergraf, og udleder et svar ved at kode interassociationer mellem to hypergrafer og intra-associationer i begge hypergrafer selv. Omfattende eksperimenter med to videnbaseret visuel QA og to videnbaseret tekstbaseret QA viser effektiviteten af vores metode, især for multi-hop ræsonnement problem. Vores kildekode er tilgængelig på https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'de': 'Wissensbasierte visuelle Fragebeantwortung (QA) zielt darauf ab, eine Frage zu beantworten, die visuell fundiertes externes Wissen jenseits von Bildinhalten erfordert. Die Beantwortung komplexer Fragen, die Multi-Hop-Argumentation unter schwacher Aufsicht erfordern, wird als herausforderndes Problem betrachtet, da i) der Argumentationsprozess nicht überwacht wird und ii) hochrangige Semantik von Multi-Hop-Wissensfakten erfasst werden muss. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein Konzept des Hypergraphen vor, um eine hochrangige Semantik einer Frage und einer Wissensbasis zu kodieren und Assoziationen zwischen ihnen zu erlernen. Das vorgeschlagene Modell, Hypergraph Transformer, konstruiert einen Fragenhypergraphen und einen Abfrage-bewussten Wissenshypergraphen und leitet eine Antwort ab, indem Inter-Assoziationen zwischen zwei Hypergraphen und Intra-Assoziationen in beiden Hypergraphen selbst kodiert werden. Umfangreiche Experimente an zwei wissensbasierten visuellen QA und zwei wissensbasierten textuellen QA zeigen die Wirksamkeit unserer Methode, insbesondere für Multi-Hop-Argumentationsprobleme. Unser Quellcode ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na vizualnom pitanju na temelju znanja (QA) je cilj odgovoriti na pitanje koje zahtijeva vizualno osnovano vanjsko znanje izvan sadržaja slike. Odgovor o složenim pitanjima koje zahtijevaju razmatranje multi hop a pod slabim nadzorom smatra se izazovnim problemom jer i) ne daje nadzor procesu razvoda i ii) treba uhvatiti visokoredne semantike činjenica multihopova znanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo koncept hipergrafa za kodiranje semantika visokog nivoa pitanja i baze znanja i naučiti visokoredne asocijacije između njih. Predloženi model, Hypergraph Transformer, izgradi pitanje hipergrafa i hipergraf znanja koji su svjesni od pitanja, i zarađuje odgovor kodiranjem inter-asocijacija između dva hipergrafa i intra-asocijacija u samom hipergrafu. Prošireni eksperimenti na dva vizuelna QA na znanju i dva tekstualna QA na znanju pokazuju učinkovitost naše metode, posebno za multihopski problem razumijevanja. Naš izvorni kod je dostupan na https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ko': '지식 기반의 시각 퀴즈(QA)는 이미지 내용 자체 이외의 시각적 기초 외부 지식이 필요한 질문에 대답하기 위한 것이다.약한 감독 아래 다중 추리가 필요한 복잡한 문제에 대답하는 것은 도전적인 문제로 여겨진다. i) 추리 과정에 감독이 없기 때문에ii)는 다중 추리 지식 사실의 높은 의미를 포착해야 한다.본고에서 우리는 초도 개념을 도입하여 문제와 지식 라이브러리의 고급 의미를 인코딩하고 그들 간의 높은 관련성을 배운다.제시된 하이퍼텍스트 변환 모델은 하나의 문제 하이퍼텍스트와 조회 감지 지식 하이퍼텍스트를 구축하고 두 개의 하이퍼텍스트 간의 상호 관련과 두 개의 하이퍼텍스트 자체의 내부 관련을 인코딩하여 답을 추정한다.두 가지 지식 기반의 시각적 품질 보증과 두 가지 지식 기반의 텍스트 품질 보증에 대한 대량의 실험은 우리의 방법의 유효성을 증명했고 특히 다중 추리 문제에 대해 증명했다.저희 소스 코드는https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'id': 'Jawaban pertanyaan visual berdasarkan pengetahuan (QA) bermaksud menjawab pertanyaan yang membutuhkan pengetahuan luar berdasarkan penglihatan diluar isi gambar sendiri. Jawab pertanyaan kompleks yang memerlukan alasan multi-hop di bawah pengawasan lemah dianggap sebagai masalah yang menantang karena i) tidak ada pengawasan diberikan pada proses reasoning dan ii) semantik tinggi fakta pengetahuan multi-hop perlu ditangkap. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan konsep hipergraf untuk mengkode semantik tingkat tinggi pertanyaan dan dasar pengetahuan, dan untuk belajar asosiasi tinggi antara mereka. Model yang diusulkan, Hypergraph Transformer, membangun sebuah hipergraf pertanyaan dan sebuah hipergraf pengetahuan yang sadar pertanyaan, dan menyimpulkan jawaban dengan mengekodikan interasosiasi antara dua hipergraf dan intraasosiasi dalam kedua hipergraf sendiri. Eksperimen ekstensif pada dua QA visual berdasarkan pengetahuan dan dua QA tekstual berdasarkan pengetahuan menunjukkan efektivitas metode kita, terutama untuk masalah pemikiran multi-hop. Our source code is available at  https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'fa': 'جواب سؤال دیویزی (QA) بر اساس علم هدف است که به یک سؤال جواب دهد که نیاز به دانش خارجی از روی تصویر بیشتر از محتوای تصویر است. پاسخ از سوالات پیچیده\u200cای که نیاز دارند دلیل\u200cهای زیادی\u200cهاپ تحت نظر ضعیف باشند، به عنوان مشکل سخت\u200cگیری می\u200cشود، زیرا من) هیچ نظر\u200cگیری به فرایند دلیل\u200cگیری نمی\u200cشود و i i) سیمانتیک\u200cهای زیادی از حقیقت\u200cهای دانش\u200cهای زیادی\u200cهاپ نیاز دارد که دس در این کاغذ، ما یک مفهوم از هیپر گراف را معرفی می کنیم تا سیمانتیک سطح بالا از یک سوال و یک پایگاه دانش را قانون کند، و برای یاد گرفتن ارتباطات بالا بین آنها. مدل پیشنهاد، تغییرگراف، یک سؤال هیپر گراف و یک هیپر گراف دانش آگاه از سوال ساخته می\u200cشود، و پاسخی را با تغییر کودکان بین دو هیپر گراف و درون\u200cترین تغییرات در هر دو هیپر گراف وارد می\u200cکند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای روی دو QA دیده\u200cای بر اساس علم و دو QA متن بر اساس علم نشان می\u200cدهند که موثرت روش ما را نشان می\u200cدهد، مخصوصا برای مشکل منطقی چند هپ. کد منبع ما در https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'sw': 'Jibu la maswali ya kuona kwa ufahamu (QA) linalenga kujibu swali ambalo linahitaji ufahamu wa nje zaidi ya maudhui ya picha yenyewe. Kujibu maswali magumu yanayohitaji sababu ya watu wengi chini ya ufuatiliaji dhaifu inachukuliwa kuwa ni tatizo la changamoto tangu mimi) hakuna utawala wa kuchukuliwa kwa mchakato wa maana na i i) semantika mkubwa wa ukweli wa maarifa ya watu wengi wanahitaji kukamatwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha dhana ya ukurasa wa hali ya juu ili kuweka mfumo wa juu wa swali na msingi wa maarifa, na kujifunza mashirika ya juu kati yao. Mfano huu unapendekezwa, Transfer wa Hypergraph, unajenga sura ya maswali na hypergrafi ya maarifa yanayofahamika na utafiti, na unaathiri jibu kwa kuingiza jumuiya kati ya miwili ya hypergrafi na mashirika yanayohusiana na mipango yenyewe. Majaribio mengi kuhusu maono mawili yanayotokana na ufahamu wa QA na mbili yenye ufahamu yanaonyesha ufanisi wa njia yetu, hasa kwa matatizo ya watu wengi. Kodi letu linapatikana katika https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'tr': 'Bilim tabanly görsel sorag jogapy (QA) suratynyň özünden daşaryk bilgilerini almak üçin maksady edýär. Birnäçe-hop garaşylyk altynda gerekli soraglary jogap bermek i ň kynçylyk mesele diýip kabul edilýär) hiç hili garaşylyk sebäbi razylyga berilmeýär we i i) birnäçe-hop bilim faktalarynyň ýokary semantikleri yakalanmaly däldir. Bu kagyzda hipergrafyň bir düşünmesini ýokary düzeden bir sorag we bilim üssüni kodlamak üçin tanyşdyrýarys we olaryň arasyndaky ýokary düzeden ilişkileri öwrenmek üçin tanyşdyrýarys. Öň teklip eden nusga, Hipergraf terjimeleri, bir hipergraf we tanyş bilim hipergraf soragyny gurýar we iki hipergraf we intra-terjimeler arasyndaky inter-terjimeler ködlemeleri bilen üýtgedir. Iki bilim tabanly görnüş QA we iki bilim tabanly tekstual QA üçin döredijili deneyler biziň ýüregimiziň etkinliýetini görkezýär, ýöne birnäçe Hop razylygy meselesi üçin. Biziň çeşme kodymyz bar https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'af': "Die kennis-gebaseerde visuele vraag antwoord (QA) is doel om 'n vraag te antwoord wat visualiseerde eksterne kennis vereis buite beeld inhoud self. Die antwoord van komplekse vrae wat multi-hop-redensie onder swak supervisie nodig, word aangesien as 'n pragtige probleem omdat i) geen supervisie gegee word aan die redekende proses en ii) hoë-volgorde semantieke van multi-hop kennis fakte moet gevang word nie. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n konsepte van hipergraf om hoë vlak semantieke van 'n vraag en 'n kennis basis te kodeer en om hoë-volgorde assosiasies tussen hulle te leer. Die voorgestelde model, Hypergraph Transformer, konstrukteer 'n vraag hipergraf en 'n navraag-awarene kennis hipergraf, en inferer 'n antwoord deur kodering inter-assosiasies tussen twee hipergraf en intra-assosiasies in beide hipergraf self. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op twee kennis-gebaseerde visuele QA en twee kennis-gebaseerde tekstuele QA vertoon die effektiviteit van ons metode, veral vir multihops-redekening probleme. Ons bronkode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.", 'am': 'እውቀት-based የዓይነት መልስ (QA) በምዕራብ ጥያቄ ውጪ እውቀት በሚያስፈልገው ጥያቄ ይመልስ ዘንድ ነው፡፡ የደካማ ማኅበረሰብ ጥያቄን በመቀበል ጥያቄዎች ከኔ ጀምሮ አዋቂ ጉዳይ ሆኖ እንደሚያስፈልጋቸው ጥያቄዎች፣ ለዋጋው ጉዳይ እና (i i) ለብዙ-hop እውቀት እውነተኞች ማኅበረሰብ ማኅበረሰብ አይፈልግም፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የከፍተኛ ደረጃዎች የጥያቄ እና እውቀት መቀመጫን ለማቀናቀል እና በመካከላቸው ከፍተኛ ትርጉም ማኅበረሰብ እናስተማራለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል፣ Hypergraph Transfer፣ የጥያቄ አፍሪካ እና የውቀት እውቀት hypergraph ይሠራል፡፡ በሁለት እውቀት የዩአዊ እና ሁለት እውቀት የጽሑፍ የኩአዊ ጽሕፈት የሥርዓታችንን ውጤት፣ በተለይ ለብዙአዊ አዋቂዎች ጉዳይ ያስታያል፡፡ ምንጭ https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve vizuale të bazuara në njohuri (QA) synon të përgjigjet një pyetje që kërkon njohuri të jashtme vizuale përtej përmbajtjes së imazhit. Përgjigja e pyetjeve komplekse që kërkojnë arsyetim shumëhop ësh nën mbikqyrjen e dobët konsiderohet si një problem sfidues pasi i) nuk i jepet mbikqyrje procesit të arsyetimit dhe ii) duhet të kapen semantikë me rend të lartë të fakteve të njohurive shumëhopësh. Në këtë letër, ne futim një koncept të hipergrafisë për të koduar semantikën e nivelit të lartë të një pyetjeje dhe një bazë njohurie, dhe për të mësuar shoqata të rendit të lartë midis tyre. Modeli i propozuar, Hypergraph Transformer, ndërton një hipergraf pyetjeje dhe një hipergraf njohurie në dijeni pyetjeje dhe përfundon një përgjigje duke koduar ndër-shoqata midis dy hipergrafëve dhe brenda-shoqatave në të dy hipergrafët vetë. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në dy QA vizuale bazuar në njohuri dhe dy QA tekstuale bazuar në njohuri tregojnë efektshmërinë e metodës sonë, veçanërisht për problemet e arsyetimit multi-hop. Kodi ynë burimi është në dispozicion në https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'hy': 'Knowledge-based visual question answering (QA) aims to answer a question which requires visually-grounded external knowledge beyond image content itself.  Հարձագանքը բարդ հարցերին, որոնք պահանջում են բազմահուսային մտածելակերպ թույլ վերահսկման տակ, համարվում է մարտահրավեր, քանի որ i) մտածելակերպը վերահսկելակերպ չի տրվում, և i) բազմահուսային գիտելակցության փաստերի բարձր սեմանտիկական պետք է վեր Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք հիպերգրաֆիայի գաղափար, որպեսզի կոդավորենք բարձր մակարդակի սեմանտիկա հարցի և գիտելիքի հիմքի մասին, և սովորենք դրանց միջև բարձր կարգչային կապեր: The proposed model, Hypergraph Transformer, constructs a question hypergraph and a query-aware knowledge hypergraph, and infers an answer by encoding inter-associations between two hypergraphs and intra-associations in both hypergraph itself.  Մեր մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը ցույց է տալիս երկու գիտելիքի հիմնված վիզուալ QA-ի և երկու գիտելիքի հիմնված տեքստալ QA-ի վրա, հատկապես բազմահուսական մտածողության խնդիրների համար: Մեր աղբյուր կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিক প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউ এ) লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়ার যা ছবির বিষয়বস্তুর বাইর যে সমস্ত জটিল প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়া হয় তাদের দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণের অধীনে কারণ দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণের ক্ষেত্রে কোন সমস্যা হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হচ্ছে যেহেতু আমি কোন কারণের কারণে  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি হাইপার্গ্রাফের ধারণা দেখাচ্ছি যাতে প্রশ্নের উচ্চপর্যায়ের সেম্যান্টিক্স এবং জ্ঞানের বেসের কোড লিখে দেয় প্রস্তাবিত মডেল, হাইপার্গ্রাফ ট্রান্সফার্নার, একটি প্রশ্ন হাইপার্গ্রাফ এবং একটি প্রশ্নের জ্ঞান জ্ঞান হাইপার্গ্রাফ তৈরি করে এবং দুই হাইপার্গ্রাফ এবং ইন্ দুই জ্ঞান ভিত্তিক কিউএ এবং দুই জ্ঞান ভিত্তিক কিউএ-এর উপর বিশেষ পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে আমাদের পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম, বিশেষ করে বহুহাপ কারণে আমাদের উৎস কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'bs': 'Odgovor na vizuelnim pitanjima na znanju (QA) je cilj odgovoriti na pitanje koje zahtijeva vizualno osnovano vanjsko znanje izvan sadržaja slika. Odgovor na složena pitanja koje zahtijevaju multihopski razgovor pod slabim nadzorom smatra se izazovnim problemom jer i) ne daje nadzor procesu razvoda i ii) treba uhvatiti visokoredne semantike činjenica multihopskih znanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo koncept hipergrafa kako bi kodirali semantiku visokog nivoa pitanja i bazu znanja i naučili visokoredne asocijacije između njih. Predloženi model, Hypergraph Transformer, izgradi pitanje hipergrafa i hipergraf znanja, koji su svesni od pitanja, i zarađuje odgovor kodiranjem inter-asocijacija između dva hipergrafa i intra-asocijacija u samom hipergrafu. Eksperimenti na dva vizuelna QA na znanju i dva tekstualna QA na znanju pokazuju učinkovitost naše metode, posebno za multihopski razumni problem. Naš izvorni kod je dostupan na https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'az': 'Bilim-tabanlı vizuel sual cavab vermək məqsədilə şəkillərin məlumatından daha çox görsel-yerli dış bilgi lazım olan bir suala cavab vermək istəyir. Müxtəlif suallara cavab vermək zəif gözləmə altında çoxlu-Hop razılığı lazımdır, çünki i) heç bir gözləmə dəyişiklik prosesi verilmədi və ii) çoxlu-Hop bilgi faktlarının yüksək səviyyətli semantik qəbul edilməsi lazımdır. Bu kağızda, bir sual və elm üssünün yüksək seviyyətli semantiklərini kodlamaq və onların arasında yüksək sıralar bağlantılarını öyrənmək üçün hipergraf fikrini tanıdırıq. Önülləşdirilmiş model, Hypergraph Transformer, bir hipergraf və query-aware bilgi hipergrafı in şa edir və iki hipergraf və iki hipergraf arasındakı inter-bağlantılar arasında bir cavab verir. İki bilim-tabanlı görünüllü QA və iki bilim-tabanlı textual QA təşviyyətimizin, özellikle çoxlu-Hop razılaşma problemi üçün çoxlu təşviyyəti göstərir. Bizim mənbə kodumuz https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ca': "Knowledge-based visual question answering (QA) aims to answer a question which requires visually-grounded external knowledge beyond image content itself.  Respondre a preguntes complexes que requereixen raonament multi-hop sota una supervisió dèbil es considera un problema desafiant, ja que i) no s'ha donat supervisió al procés de raonament i ii) s'ha de capturar la semàntica d'alta ordre de fets de coneixement multihop. En aquest article introduim un concepte d'hipergrafia per codificar la semàntica d'un alt nivell d'una pregunta i una base de coneixement, i per aprendre associacions d'alta ordre entre ells. El model proposat, Hypergraph Transformer, construeix una hipergràfica de preguntes i una hipergràfica de coneixement conscient de preguntes, i infereix una resposta codificant interasociacions entre dos hipergràfics i intraasociacions en ambdós hipergràfics mateixos. Els extensos experiments en dos QA visual basats en el coneixement i dos QA textual basats en el coneixement demostren l'eficacia del nostre mètode, especialment per al problema de raonament multi hop. El nostre codi fontestà disponible en https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.", 'cs': 'Znalostně založené vizuální odpovědi na otázky (QA) si klade za cíl odpovědět na otázku, která vyžaduje vizuálně zakotvené externí znalosti mimo samotný obrazový obsah. Zodpovězení složitých otázek, které vyžadují multi-hop uvažování pod slabým dohledem, je považováno za náročný problém, protože i) proces uvažování není dán žádný dohled a ii) je třeba zachytit vysoce řádnou sémantiku multi-hop znalostních faktů. V tomto článku představujeme koncept hypergrafu pro kódování vysoké úrovně sémantiky otázky a znalostní báze a naučení se mezi nimi vzájemných asociací. Navržený model, Hypergraph Transformer, konstruuje hypergraf otázek a hypergraf znalostí orientovaný na dotazy a odvozuje odpověď kódováním meziasociací mezi dvěma hypergrafy a intraasociací v obou hypergrafech samotných. Rozsáhlé experimenty na dvou znalostně založených vizuálních QA a dvou znalostně založených textových QA demonstrují efektivitu naší metody, zejména pro problematiku multi-hop uvažování. Náš zdrojový kód je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'et': 'Teadmistepõhise visuaalse küsimustele vastamise eesmärk on vastata küsimusele, mis nõuab visuaalselt põhjendatud väliseid teadmisi lisaks pildisisule endale. Keerulistele küsimustele vastamist, mis nõuavad mitme hüppega arutlemist nõrga järelevalve all, peetakse keeruliseks probleemiks, kuna i) arutlemisprotsessile ei anta järelevalvet ja ii) tuleb koguda mitme hüppega teadmiste kõrgetasemelist semantikat. Käesolevas töös tutvustame hüpergraafi kontseptsiooni, et kodeerida kõrgetasemelist semantikat küsimus ja teadmistebaas ning õppida kõrgetasemelisi seoseid nende vahel. Kavandatud mudel hüpergraafimuundur konstrueerib küsimuse hüpergraafi ja päringuteadliku teadmiste hüpergraafi ning järeldab vastuse, kodeerides kahe hüpergraafi ja mõlemas hüpergraafis omavahelisi seoseid. Laiaulatuslikud eksperimendid kahe teadmistepõhise visuaalse kvaliteedi tagamise ja kahe teadmistepõhise tekstilise kvaliteedi tagamisega näitavad meie meetodi efektiivsust, eriti multi-hop arutlusprobleemi puhul. Meie lähtekood on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'fi': 'Tietopohjainen visuaalinen kysymyksenvastaus (QA) pyrkii vastaamaan kysymykseen, joka vaatii visuaalisesti perusteltua ulkoista tietoa kuvasisällön lisäksi. Monihop-päättelyä vaativiin monimutkaisiin kysymyksiin vastaamista heikossa valvonnassa pidetään haastavana ongelmana, koska i) päättelyprosessia ei valvota ja ii) monihop-tietofaktojen korkean järjestyksen semantiikka on otettava talteen. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme hypergraafin käsitteen, joka koodaa korkean tason semantiikkaa kysymyksestä ja tietokannasta, ja oppia korkean järjestyksen yhteyksiä niiden välillä. Ehdotettu Hypergraph Transformer -malli rakentaa kysymyksen hypergraafin ja kyselytietoisen tiedon hypergraafin ja päättelee vastauksen koodaamalla kahden hypergraafin välisiä yhteyksiä ja sisäisiä yhteyksiä molemmissa hypergraafissa itsessään. Laajat kokeilut kahdesta tietopohjaisesta visuaalisesta laadunvarmistuksesta ja kahdesta tietopohjaisesta tekstilaadunvarmistuksesta osoittavat menetelmämme tehokkuuden erityisesti multi-hop-päättelyongelmassa. Lähdekoodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'sk': 'Namen vizualnega odgovarjanja na vprašanja, ki temelji na znanju, je odgovor na vprašanje, ki zahteva vizualno utemeljeno zunanje znanje onkraj same slikovne vsebine. Odgovarjanje na kompleksna vprašanja, ki zahtevajo multi-hop razmišljanje pod šibkim nadzorom, velja za zahteven problem, saj i) proces razmišljanja ni nadzorovan in ii) je treba zajeti visoko semantiko multi-hop znanja dejstev. V prispevku predstavljamo koncept hipergrafa za kodiranje visokostopenjske semantike vprašanja in baze znanja ter učenje visokostopenjskih povezav med njima. Predlagani model, Hypergraph Transformer, konstruira hipergraf vprašanja in hipergraf znanja, ki se zaveda poizvedbe, ter sklepa odgovor s kodiranjem medsebojnih povezav med dvema hipergrafima in znotraj povezav v obeh hipergrafih. Obsežni eksperimenti na dveh znanju temelječih vizualnih kakovosti in dveh na znanju temelječih besedilnih kakovosti kažejo učinkovitost naše metode, zlasti pri multi-hop razmišljanju problemov. Naša izvorna koda je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'ha': "QA Answering complex questions that require multi-hop reasoning under weak supervision is considered as a challenging problem since i) no supervision is given to the reasoning process and ii) high-order semantics of multi-hop knowledge facts need to be captured.  Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wani idãnar Hypergrafi dõmin ka kodi semantiki masu sarrafa na masu tambaya da wani ma'anar ilmi, kuma mu sanar da mutane masu sarrafa a tsakaninsu. @ info: whatsthis Akwai jarrabo masu ƙaranci a kan karatun biyu a kan kunnuwa na QA da matsalan QA guda biyu na sani sun nuna tayari na hanyoyinmu, da haske ga matabbata masu hankali masu yawa. Kodi na ƙarƙashin mu yana da https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.", 'jv': 'Bilih-basa perspek pintuan gambar (qA) iku mbutuhake perspek sing isine mepe ngubah cebo sing nyatakake supaya diangkat apa-supaya sane nesaturan karo nesaturan gambar. Rêngêngêng langkung dipun-suarané sing takon nêmên multi Nang pentungé iki, kéné gunakake ingkang diangkat parangan sing nggawe semanti kuwi tanggal luwih lan nganggo kuwi tindakan kesempatan, lan uga iso nggawe barang langgar tarjamahan luwih The proposal model, HyErraph Transformer, rebuct a question HyErraph and a query-awake knowinghood HyErraph, and heres an response by koding inter-Associations amongst 2 HyErraph and Inta-Associations in all of the HyErraph automatically. The proposal model, HyErraph Transformer, structural navigation OUT = VeriSign Trust Network Pak-pernik kode sing dibutuhke nang https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'he': 'עונה על שאלות ויזואליות מבוססת על ידע (QA) מטרה לענות על שאלה שדורשת ידע חיצוני מבוסס על מידע מעבר לתוכן התמונה עצמו. תשובה לשאלות מורכבות שדורשות סיבוב רב-הופ תחת פיקוח חלש נחשבת כמו בעיה מאתגרת מאחר i) לא נותנת שום פיקוח לתהליך ההגיון ii) סמנטיקה גבוהה של עובדות ידע רב-הופ צריכות להיתפס. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מושג של היפרגרף כדי לקוד סמנטיקה ברמה גבוהה של שאלה ובסיס ידע, וללמד איגודים ברמה גבוהה ביניהם. המודל המוצע, Hypergraph Transformer, בונה היפרגרף שאלה ויפרגרף ידע מודע לשאלות, ומוציא תשובה על ידי קידום יחסים בין שני היפרגרפים ואיחסים בתוך שני היפרגרפים עצמו. Extensive experiments on two knowledge-based visual QA and two knowledge-based textual QA demonstrate the effectiveness of our method, especially for multi-hop reasoning problem.  קוד המקור שלנו זמין ב https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.', 'bo': 'ཚན་རིག་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མཐོང་བའི་འདྲི་ཚིག་ལན་པ(QA)ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་འདྲི་ཚིག་ལ་མཐོང་སྣང་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་ཕྱི་རིག ཧ་ཅང་གི་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དགོས་པའི་བསམ་བློ་རིམ་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཅིག་གནད་དོན་དགོས་མེད་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་སྐབས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། i) རྟོགས་བསམ་བ འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་མཐུན་རིམ་མཐུན་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་དང་། The proposed model, Hypergraph Transformer, constructs a question hypergraph and a query-aware knowledge hypergraph, and infers an answer by encoding inter-associations between two hypergraphs and intra-associations in both hypergraph itself. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བའི་ཀློག་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་དང་ཤེས ང་ཚོའི་ཐོག་མའི་ཁུངས་ཨང་རྟགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ https://github.com/yujungheo/kbvqa-public.'}
{'en': 'Headed-Span-Based Projective Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'تحويل النص إلى كلام غير ذاتي الانحدار', 'fr': "VAE conditionnée à l'énonciation croisée pour la synthèse vocale non autorégressive", 'es': 'VAE condicionado por enunciado cruzado para conversión de texto a voz no autorregresiva', 'pt': 'VAE condicionado de expressão cruzada para conversão de texto em fala não autorregressiva', 'ja': '自動回帰しないテキストから音声へのクロスオーバランス条件付きVAE', 'zh': '非自归文本至语音转换语具 VAE', 'hi': 'गैर-Autoregressive पाठ-से-भाषण के लिए क्रॉस-उच्चारण वातानुकूलित VAE', 'ru': 'VAE с перекрестными помехами для неавторегрессивного синтеза речи', 'ga': 'Tras-Urlabhra VAE Coinníollach do Téacs-go-Caint Neamh-Uath-fhorchéimneach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διασταυρωμένο VAE για μη αυτοανακριτικό κείμενο σε ομιλία', 'hu': 'Kereszt- Utterancia kondicionált VAE nem automatikus szöveg- és beszédkészítéshez', 'it': 'VAE condizionale per il testo a voce non autoregressivo', 'lt': 'Įvairių sąlygų taikymas neautoregresiniam tekstui į kalbą', 'mk': 'Крсто- условен VAE за неавторогресивен текст- во- говор', 'kk': 'Авто- регрессивне емес мәтін- мен сөйлеу үшін бірнеше утеранс шарты VAE', 'ml': 'സ്വയമില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ക്രോസ്- എട്ട്രെയിന്\u200dസ് നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ VAE', 'mt': 'VAE Kondizzjonata għal Utterance Cross Conditioned for Non-Autoregressive Text-to-Speech', 'ms': 'VAE Berkondisi Salib-Utterance untuk Teks-ke-Ucapan Tidak-Autoregressiv', 'mn': 'Өөрөөр сэргээгдэхгүй текст-ээс илтгэх үед ДОХ хэрэглэх шаардлагатай', 'no': 'Kryss- brukar- vilkårleg VAE for ikkje- autoregressiv tekst- til- tale', 'pl': 'Warunkowany krzyżowy VAE dla nieautoresywnego tekstu na mowę', 'ro': 'VAE condiționat cu încrucișare pentru text-la-vorbire non-autoregresiv', 'sr': 'Усложени ДВЕ за неавторегресивно текст до речи', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE för icke-autoregressiv text-till-tal', 'so': 'VAE-Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE for Non-Autoregressive Text-to-Speech', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி கட்டுப்படுத்தாத உரையில் இருந்து பேச்சுக்கு குறிப்பு- வெளியீடு நிரந்தரமான VAE', 'ur': 'بغیر اٹوگریسٹیو ٹیکسٹ سے کلام کے لئے کرس- استٹرانس کی وضعیت والی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chuyển đổi tần số cho Không tự động văn bản sang diễn văn', 'da': 'Krydsbetinget VAE for ikke- autoregressiv tekst- til- tale', 'bg': 'Кондициониран VAE за неавторегресивен текст в реч', 'hr': 'Conditioned VAE za non- autoregressive tekst- to- govor', 'nl': 'Cross-Utterance conditioned VAE voor niet-autoregressieve tekst-naar-spraak', 'de': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE für nicht autoregressive Text-to-Speech', 'id': 'VAE bersyarat-Utterance untuk Teks-ke-Bicara Tidak-Autoregressiv', 'fa': 'شرط استفاده از طریق استفاده VAE برای متن به سخنرانی غیر خودگریز', 'ko': '비자귀환 텍스트에서 음성으로의 교차 언어 조건 변분', 'sw': 'VAE yenye Utumiaji wa Kusini', 'tr': 'Otomatik Gaýşartma Metin-tä Sözlemek üçin Ullanyş Aralygy VAE', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'VAE e kushtuar për tekst-në-fjalim jo-autoregresiv', 'am': 'AutoRegressive Text-to-Speech', 'hy': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE for Non-Autoregressive Text-to-Speech', 'az': 'Autoregressiv olmayan Metin-to-Söz üçün Xərc-Utterance Şablon VAE', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রিত টেক্সট- থেকে বক্তৃতার জন্য ক্রস- উট্ট্রেন্স বিধান VAE', 'bs': 'Conditioned VAE za non-autoregressive tekst-to-govor', 'ca': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE for Non-Autoregressive Text-to-Speech', 'cs': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE pro non-autoregresivní text-to-Speech', 'et': 'Ristsõnadega konditsioneeritud VAE mittearregressiivse teksti kõneks muutmiseks', 'fi': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE for Non-Autoregressive Text-to-Speech', 'jv': 'layer-mode-effects', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'VAE מצב השימוש בתנאי ללא אוטורגרסיבי טקסט לאיבוד', 'sk': 'Navzkrižno izražen VAE za nesamoregresivno besedilo v govor', 'bo': 'Cross-Utterance Conditioned VAE for Non-Autoregressive Text-to-Speech'}
{'en': 'We propose a new method for projective dependency parsing based on headed spans. In a projective dependency tree, the largest subtree rooted at each word covers a contiguous sequence (i.e., a span) in the surface order. We call such a span marked by a root word headed span. A projective dependency tree can be represented as a collection of headed spans. We decompose the score of a dependency tree into the scores of the headed spans and design a novel O(n^3) dynamic programming algorithm to enable global training and exact inference. Our model achieves state-of-the-art or competitive results on PTB, CTB, and UD', 'ar': 'تعد نمذجة تباين العرض أمرًا بالغ الأهمية لتجميع الكلام الطبيعي والتعبري في أنظمة تحويل النص إلى كلام (TTS) من طرف إلى طرف. في هذا البحث ، يُقترح VAE (CUC-VAE) للتعبير المتقاطع لتقدير التوزيع الاحتمالي اللاحق لميزات الصوت الكامن لكل صوت عن طريق تكييف الميزات الصوتية ومعلومات المتحدث وميزات النص التي تم الحصول عليها من الجمل السابقة والمستقبلية . في وقت الاستدلال ، بدلاً من التوزيع القياسي Gaussian الذي تستخدمه VAE ، يسمح CUC-VAE بأخذ عينات من التوزيع المسبق الخاص بكلام محدد بشرط معلومات الكلام المتبادل ، مما يسمح بربط ميزات العرض التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة نظام تحويل النص إلى كلام (TTS) بالسياق و يشبه إلى حد كبير كيفية إنتاج البشر بشكل طبيعي للعروض. يتم تقييم أداء CUC-VAE من خلال اختبار الاستماع النوعي للطبيعية والوضوح والقياسات الكمية ، بما في ذلك معدلات أخطاء الكلمات والانحراف المعياري لسمات العرض. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على بيانات LJ-Speech و LibriTTS أن نظام CUC-VAE TTS المقترح يحسن الطبيعة ويعرض التنوع بهوامش واضحة.', 'es': 'El modelado de la variación de la prosodia es fundamental para sintetizar el habla natural y expresiva en los sistemas de texto a voz (TTS) de extremo a extremo. En este artículo, se propone un VAE condicional de enunciado cruzado (CUC-VAE) para estimar una distribución de probabilidad posterior de las características de prosodia latente para cada fonema mediante el condicionamiento de las características acústicas, la información del hablante y las características del texto obtenidas de oraciones pasadas y futuras. En el momento de la inferencia, en lugar de la distribución gaussiana estándar utilizada por VAE, CUC-VAE permite el muestreo de una distribución previa específica de enunciado condicionada a la información de enunciados cruzados, lo que permite que las características de prosodia generadas por el sistema TTS estén relacionadas con el contexto y es más similar a cómo los humanos producen prosodia de forma natural. El rendimiento de CUC-VAE se evalúa mediante una prueba de escucha cualitativa para determinar la naturalidad, la inteligibilidad y las mediciones cuantitativas, incluidas las tasas de error de palabras y la desviación estándar de los atributos de prosodia. Los resultados experimentales sobre los datos de LJ-Speech y LiBritts muestran que el sistema CUC-VAE TTS propuesto mejora la naturalidad y la diversidad de prosodia con márgenes claros.', 'fr': "La modélisation de la variation de la prosodie est essentielle pour synthétiser la parole naturelle et expressive dans les systèmes de synthèse vocale (TTS) de bout en bout. Dans cet article, une VAE conditionnelle d'énonciation croisée (CUC-VAE) est proposée pour estimer une distribution de probabilité postérieure des caractéristiques de prosodie latentes pour chaque phonème en conditionnant les caractéristiques acoustiques, les informations sur le locuteur et les caractéristiques textuelles obtenues à partir de phrases passées et futures. Au moment de l'inférence, au lieu de la distribution gaussienne standard utilisée par VAE, CUC-VAE permet d'échantillonner à partir d'une distribution antérieure spécifique à l'énoncé conditionnée sur des informations d'énonciation croisée, ce qui permet aux caractéristiques de prosodie générées par le système TTS d'être liées au contexte et est plus similaire à la façon dont les humains produisent naturellement de la prosodie. Les performances de CUC-VAE sont évaluées via un test d'écoute qualitatif pour le naturel, l'intelligibilité et les mesures quantitatives, y compris les taux d'erreur de mots et l'écart type des attributs de prosodie. Les résultats expérimentaux sur les données LJ-Speech et Libritts montrent que le système TTS CUC-VAE proposé améliore le naturel et la diversité de la prosodie avec des marges claires.", 'pt': 'A modelagem da variação da prosódia é fundamental para sintetizar a fala natural e expressiva em sistemas de conversão de texto em fala (TTS) de ponta a ponta. Neste artigo, um VAE condicional de expressão cruzada (CUC-VAE) é proposto para estimar uma distribuição de probabilidade posterior dos traços latentes da prosódia para cada fonema, condicionando os traços acústicos, informações do falante e traços do texto obtidos de sentenças passadas e futuras. . No momento da inferência, ao invés da distribuição gaussiana padrão usada pelo VAE, o CUC-VAE permite a amostragem de uma distribuição prévia específica do enunciado condicionada a informações entre os enunciados, o que permite que as características de prosódia geradas pelo sistema TTS sejam relacionadas ao contexto e é mais semelhante à forma como os humanos produzem prosódia naturalmente. O desempenho do CUC-VAE é avaliado por meio de um teste qualitativo de audição para naturalidade, inteligibilidade e medidas quantitativas, incluindo taxas de erro de palavras e desvio padrão dos atributos da prosódia. Resultados experimentais em dados LJ-Speech e LibriTTS mostram que o sistema CUC-VAE TTS proposto melhora a naturalidade e diversidade de prosódia com margens claras.', 'ja': 'プロソディーの変動をモデル化することは、エンドツーエンドのテキストツースピーチ（ TTS ）システムで自然で表現的な音声を合成するために重要である。 本論文では、音響特徴、スピーカー情報、および過去および将来の文の両方から得られたテキスト特徴を条件とすることにより、各音素の潜在的なプロソディ特徴の事後確率分布を推定するためのクロスオッタランス条件付きVAE (CUC - VAE)が提案されている。 推論時間では、ＶＡＥによって使用される標準的なガウス分布の代わりに、ＣＵＣ － ＶＡＥは、クロスオウタランス情報に条件付けられた発話固有の事前分布からのサンプリングを可能にし、これにより、ＴＴＳシステムによって生成されるプロソディー特徴が文脈に関連し、ヒトが自然にプロソディーを生成する方法とより類似することを可能にする。 CUC - VAEのパフォーマンスは、自然性、明瞭性、およびワードエラー率およびプロソディ属性の標準偏差を含む定量的測定に関する定性的リスニングテストを通じて評価される。 LJ - SpechおよびLibriTTSデータの実験結果は、提案されたCUC - VAE TTSシステムが、明確なマージンで自然さと多様性を向上させることを示しています。', 'zh': '对韵律变异建模于端至端文本至语音转易 (TTS) 统中合成自然与富表现力语音至重。 本文设交语VAE(CUC-VAE),因往与来声学得声学、言息、文本条件反射,以度音素潜于韵后验概率分布。 CUC-VAE非VAE用之准斯布也,许从以交语信息为资特定语先验布中采样,使TTS统生者韵特征与上下文相关,而尤类自然之韵。 CUC-VAE性以定性听试自然性,可解度量,单词错误率韵偏差。 LJ-Speech与LibriTTS数之实验结果表明,所建CUC-VAE TTS统崇自然性韵多样性,有明裕量。', 'ru': 'Моделирование вариации прозоди имеет решающее значение для синтеза естественной и экспрессивной речи в системах «от текста до речи» (TTS). В этой статье предлагается перекрестное условное VAE (CUC-VAE) для оценки апостериорного вероятностного распределения скрытых протезных признаков для каждой фонемы путем обусловленности акустическими признаками, информацией о дикторе и текстовыми признаками, полученными как из прошлых, так и из будущих предложений. Во время вывода, вместо стандартного гауссового распределения, используемого VAE, CUC-VAE допускает выборку из специфичного для высказывания предшествующего распределения, основанного на информации о перекрестных помехах, что позволяет характеристикам прозоди, генерируемым системой TTS, быть связанными с контекстом и более похожими на то, как люди естественным образом производят прозоди. Производительность CUC-VAE оценивается с помощью качественного теста на естественность, разборчивость и количественные измерения, включая частоту ошибок слов и стандартное отклонение атрибутов просодии. Экспериментальные результаты по данным LJ-Speech и LibriTTS показывают, что предлагаемая система CUC-VAE TTS улучшает естественность и разнообразие прозоди с четкими границами.', 'hi': 'मॉडलिंग प्रोसोडी भिन्नता एंड-टू-एंड टेक्स्ट-टू-स्पीच (टीटीएस) सिस्टम में प्राकृतिक और अभिव्यंजक भाषण को संश्लेषित करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। इस पेपर में, एक क्रॉस-उच्चारण सशर्त वीएई (सीयूसी-वीएई) को ध्वनिक सुविधाओं, स्पीकर जानकारी और पिछले और भविष्य के वाक्यों दोनों से प्राप्त पाठ सुविधाओं पर कंडीशनिंग करके प्रत्येक फोनमे के लिए अव्यक्त प्रोसोडी सुविधाओं के पीछे की संभावना वितरण का अनुमान लगाने का प्रस्ताव है। अनुमान समय पर, वीएई द्वारा उपयोग किए जाने वाले मानक गाऊसी वितरण के बजाय, सीयूसी-वीएई क्रॉस-उच्चारण जानकारी पर वातानुकूलित एक उच्चारण-विशिष्ट पूर्व वितरण से नमूने की अनुमति देता है, जो टीटीएस सिस्टम द्वारा उत्पन्न प्रोसोडी विशेषताओं को संदर्भ से संबंधित होने की अनुमति देता है और मनुष्य स्वाभाविक रूप से प्रोसोडी का उत्पादन करने के तरीके के समान है। CUC-VAE के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन प्राकृतिकता, बोधगम्यता और मात्रात्मक माप के लिए एक गुणात्मक सुनने के परीक्षण के माध्यम से किया जाता है, जिसमें शब्द त्रुटि दर और प्रोसोडी विशेषताओं के मानक विचलन शामिल हैं। LJ-Speech और LibriTTS डेटा पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित CUC-VAE TTS सिस्टम स्पष्ट मार्जिन के साथ प्राकृतिकता और prosody विविधता में सुधार करता है।', 'ga': 'Tá sé ríthábhachtach éagsúlacht prósóide a shamhaltú chun cainte nádúrtha agus léiritheach a shintéisiú i gcórais téacs-go-hurlabhra (TTS) ceann go ceann. Sa pháipéar seo, moltar tras-ráiteas coinníollach VAE (CUC-VAE) chun dáileadh dóchúlachta posterior na ngnéithe folaigh prósóide do gach fóinéim a mheas trí riochtú a dhéanamh ar ghnéithe fuaimiúla, faisnéis chainteora, agus gnéithe téacs a fhaightear ó abairtí san am atá thart agus san am atá le teacht. . Ag am tátal, in ionad an dáileadh caighdeánach Gaussach a úsáideann VAE, ceadaíonn CUC-VAE sampláil a dhéanamh ó réamhdháileadh sainiúil ar chaint atá coinníollaithe ar fhaisnéis tras-ráitis, a cheadaíonn na gnéithe prósóide a ghineann an córas TTS a bheith bainteach leis an gcomhthéacs agus níos cosúla leis an gcaoi a dtáirgeann daoine prósóid go nádúrtha. Déantar feidhmíocht CUC-VAE a mheas trí thástáil éisteachta cháilíochtúil le haghaidh nádúrthachta, intuigtheachta agus tomhais chainníochtúla, lena n-áirítear rátaí earráide focal agus diall caighdeánach tréithe prósóide. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar shonraí LJ-Speech agus LibriTTS go bhfeabhsaíonn an córas TTS CUC-VAE atá beartaithe nádúrthacht agus éagsúlacht prósóide le corrlaigh soiléire.', 'el': 'Η μοντελοποίηση παραλλαγών προνodiας είναι κρίσιμη για τη σύνθεση της φυσικής και εκφραστικής ομιλίας σε ολοκληρωμένα συστήματα κειμένου-σε-ομιλίας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνεται μια διασταυρούμενη κατανομή πιθανοτήτων των λανθάνοντων προσωodiακών χαρακτηριστικών για κάθε φωνήµα με βάση ακουστικά χαρακτηριστικά, πληροφορίες ομιλητή και χαρακτηριστικά κειμένου που λαμβάνονται τόσο από προηγούμενες όσο και από μελλοντικές προτάσεις. Κατά τη διάρκεια του συμπεράσματος, αντί για την τυπική Gaussian κατανομή που χρησιμοποιείται από το VAE, το CUC-VAE επιτρέπει τη δειγματοληψία από μια συγκεκριμένη προηγούμενη διανομή που εξαρτάται από πληροφορίες διασταυρούμενης έκφρασης, η οποία επιτρέπει τα προνodiα χαρακτηριστικά που παράγονται από το σύστημα TTS να σχετίζονται με το πλαίσιο και είναι πιο παρόμοια με τον τρόπο με τον οποίο οι άνθρωποι παράγουν φυσικά προσωδία. Η απόδοση του αξιολογείται μέσω ποιοτικού τεστ ακρόασης για φυσικότητα, κατανοητότητα και ποσοτικές μετρήσεις, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των ποσοστών σφαλμάτων λέξεων και της τυπικής απόκλισης των χαρακτηριστικών προνodiας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δεδομένα LJ-Speech και LibriTTS δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο σύστημα βελτιώνει τη φυσικότητα και την προσωδική ποικιλομορφία με σαφή περιθώρια.', 'hu': 'A prosódia variáció modellezése kritikus fontosságú a természetes és kifejező beszéd szintetizálásához a végpontos szöveg-beszéd (TTS) rendszerekben. Jelen tanulmányban egy keresztkimondási feltételes VAE (CUC-VAE) keresztkimondási feltételes VAE (CUC-VAE) javaslatot teszünk arra, hogy becsüljük a látens prosódia jellemzők hátsó valószínűségi eloszlását az egyes fonemák akusztikai tulajdonságainak, a hangszóró információinak és a múltbeli és jövőbeli mondatokból egyaránt kapott szövegjellemzőknek. A következtetési időben a VAE által használt standard gauss eloszlás helyett a CUC-VAE lehetővé teszi a mintavételt egy kimondás-specifikus előzetes eloszlásból, amely lehetővé teszi, hogy a TTS rendszer által generált prosódia jellemzők összefüggésben legyenek a kontextussal, és jobban hasonlít ahhoz, hogy az emberek természetes módon termelnek prosódiát. A CUC-VAE teljesítményét a természetesség, érthetőség és mennyiségi mérések minőségi hallgatási tesztjével értékeljük, beleértve a szó hibaarányát és a prosódia attribútumok standard eltérését. Az LJ-Speech és LibriTTS adatok kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt CUC-VAE TTS rendszer tiszta margókkal javítja a természetességet és a prosódia diverzitását.', 'ka': 'მოდელირება პროცედის განსაცემები კრიტიკურია სინტესტიზომის და გამოსახულებული სიტყვას ტექსტის დასასრულება (TTS) სისტემებში. ამ დოკუნეში, საკუთარი სიტყვების გარეშე VAE (CUC-VAE) მოძლევა აკუსტიული სიტყვების, სიტყვების ინფორმაციის და ტექსტის სიტყვების გარეშე, რომელიც მიიღებული წინა და მომავალე სიტყვების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი გარეშე. ინფრენციის დროში, VAE-ის გამოიყენებული სტანდარტური დაუსიანური განყოფილების მცად CUC-VAE მოძლია გამოიყენება სტანდარტური განყოფილებების წინ სპეციფიკალური განყოფილების ინფორმაციის შესახებ, რომელიც TTS სისტემიდან შექმნილი პროცესის განსაზღვრებ CUC-VAE-ის გამოსახულება განსაზღვრებულია კალიტატიგური სურათის ტესტის გამოყენებით, ინტელლიგურება და კოლუტატიგური განსაზღვრებისთვის, როგორც სიტყვების შეცდომა სიტყვების სიტყ Name', 'it': "Modellare la variazione della prosodia è fondamentale per sintetizzare il discorso naturale ed espressivo nei sistemi end-to-end text-to-speech (TTS). In questo articolo viene proposto un VAE condizionale cross-utterance (CUC-VAE) per stimare una distribuzione di probabilità posteriore delle caratteristiche della prosodia latente per ogni fonema condizionando le caratteristiche acustiche, le informazioni sull'altoparlante e le caratteristiche testuali ottenute da frasi passate e future. Al momento dell'inferenza, invece della distribuzione gaussiana standard utilizzata dal VAE, CUC-VAE consente il campionamento da una distribuzione precedente specifica per l'espressione condizionata da informazioni di cross-yttrance, che consente alle caratteristiche della prosodia generate dal sistema TTS di essere correlate al contesto ed è più simile a come gli esseri umani producono naturalmente prosodia. Le prestazioni di CUC-VAE sono valutate tramite un test di ascolto qualitativo per la naturalezza, l'intelligibilità e le misurazioni quantitative, compresi i tassi di errore delle parole e la deviazione standard degli attributi prosodici. I risultati sperimentali sui dati LJ-Speech e LibriTTS mostrano che il sistema CUC-VAE TTS proposto migliora la naturalezza e la diversità prosodica con margini chiari.", 'lt': 'Modeliuoti prosodijų variantus yra labai svarbus sintetizuojant natūralią ir išraišką kalbą teksto–kalbos (TTS) sistemose. Šiame dokumente siūloma kryžminio išraiško sąlyginė VAE (CUC-VAE), kad būtų įvertintas latentinių prosodijų savybių pasiskirstymas kiekvienam fonemai, atsižvelgiant į akustines savybes, kalbėtojo informaciją ir teksto savybes, gautas iš ankstesnių ir būsimų sakinių. Išvados metu, vietoj standartinio gausijos pasiskirstymo, kurį naudoja VAE, CUC-VAE leidžia imti mėginius iš išankstinio išraiškoms būdingo išraiškos pasiskirstymo, kuris priklauso nuo kryžminio išraiško informacijos, kuri leidžia TTS sistemos sukurtas prosodijos savybes susieti su aplinkybėmis ir yra panaši į tai, kaip žmonės natūraliai gamina prosodijas. CUC-VAE veiksmingumas vertinamas atliekant kokybinį klausymo bandymą natūralumui, supratimui ir kiekybiniams matavimams, įskaitant žodžių klaidų dažnį ir standartinį prosodijos požymių nuokrypį. Eksperimentiniai LJ-Speech ir LibriTTS duomenų rezultatai rodo, kad siūloma CUC-VAE TTS sistema gerina natūralumą ir prosody įvairovę aiškiai.', 'mk': 'Моделирањето на прозодиски варијации е критично за синтезирање на природниот и експресивниот говор во системите од крај до крај текст до говор (TTS). Во овој весник се предложува крстоизразен условен ВАЕ (КУЦ-ВАЕ) за проценка на подедната веројатност на дистрибуција на лантните прозодиски карактеристики за секој фоном со услов на акустички карактеристики, информации за говорникот и текстови карактеристики добиени од минатите и идните реченици. Во времето на инференција, наместо стандардната гауска дистрибуција која ја користи ВАЕ, КУЦ-ВАЕ овозможува примероци од претходна дистрибуција специфична за израз, условена со информации за крстоизраз, што овозможува прозодиските карактеристики генерирани од системот ТС да се поврзани со контекстот и е послична на тоа Преводноста на CUC-VAE се проценува преку квалитетен тест за слушање за природноста, интелигибилноста и квантитивните мерки, вклучително и стапките на зборни грешки и стандардното одбивање на атрибутите на прозодија. Експерименталните резултати на податоците на LJ-Speech и LibriTTS покажуваат дека предложениот систем CUC-VAE TTS ја подобрува природноста и прозодистичката различност со јасни маргини.', 'kk': 'Өзгерістер үлгісін өзгерту - табиғи және сөйлеу (TTS) жүйелерінде соңғы- соңғы мәтін- мен сөйлеу жүйелерінде сөйлеу үшін қиын. Бұл қағазда, әрбір фонемде акустикалық мүмкіндіктерді, орындаушы мәліметтерді және келесі сөйлемелерден алған мәтіндік мүмкіндіктерді есептеу үшін көтерілген ықтималдық VAE (CUC- VAE) арқылы сөйлемелердің кейінгі ықтималдық үлестір Айнымалы уақытта, VAE қолданылатын стандартты гаусия үлестірімінің орнына CUC- VAE үлестірімінің алдыңғы үлестірімінен бірнеше мәлімет үлестірімінен алдыңғы үлестірімінен алдыңғы үлестіру мүмкіндігін мүмкіндік береді. Бұл TTS жүйесінің құр CUC- VAE жылдамдығы натуралдық, intelligibility және санативтік өлшемі үшін квалификациялық тыңдау сынақтарымен, сөздің қатенің жиілігі және проsody атрибуттардың стандартты ауыстыруы арқылы бағалады. LJ-Speech және LibriTTS деректерінің эксперименталдық нәтижелері CUC-VAE TTS жүйесінің таңбалық шектері бойынша натуралдық және проsody әртүрлігін жасайды.', 'ms': 'Variasi prosody pemodelan adalah kritik untuk sintesis ucapan alami dan ekspresif dalam sistem teks-ke-ucapan (TTS) akhir-akhir. Dalam kertas ini, VAE syarat salib-utterance (CUC-VAE) diusulkan untuk menghargai distribusi kebarangkalian belakang ciri-ciri prosodi tersembunyi untuk setiap fonem dengan syarat pada ciri-ciri akustik, maklumat pembicara, dan ciri-ciri teks yang diperoleh dari kalimat masa lalu dan masa depan. Pada masa kesimpulan, selain daripada distribusi Gaussian piawai yang digunakan oleh VAE, CUC-VAE membenarkan penerimaan sampel dari distribusi terdahulu khusus-perkataan berkonditionasi pada maklumat salib-perkataan, yang membenarkan ciri-ciri prosody yang dijana oleh sistem TTS untuk berkaitan dengan konteks dan lebih mirip dengan bagaimana manusia secara alami menghasilkan prosody. Performasi CUC-VAE diteliti melalui ujian pendengaran kualitatif untuk kebijaksanaan, pemahaman dan pengukuran kuantitatif, termasuk kadar ralat perkataan dan deviasi piawai atribut prosody. Keputusan percubaan pada data LJ-Speech dan LibriTTS menunjukkan bahawa sistem TTS CUC-VAE yang diusulkan meningkatkan kebiasaan dan pelbagai prosody dengan margin yang jelas.', 'mt': 'Il-mudell tal-varjazzjoni tal-prosodi huwa kritiku għas-sintetizzazzjoni tad-diskors naturali u espressiv fis-sistemi tat-test għad-diskors (TTS) minn tarf sa tarf. F’dan id-dokument, hija proposta VAE kundizzjonali b’kundizzjoni ta’ kundizzjon ta’ kundizzjon (CUC-VAE) biex tiġi stmata distribuzzjoni ta’ probabbiltà posterjuri tal-karatteristiċi tal-prosodija moħbija għal kull fonem billi tiġi kundizzjonata fuq karatteristiċi akustiċi, informazzjoni tal-kelliem, u karatteristiċi tat-test miksuba kemm mis-sentenzi tal-passat kif ukoll dawk futuri. Fi żmien ta’ inferenza, minflok id-distribuzzjoni standard Gaussjana użata minn VAE, CUC-VAE jippermetti t-teħid ta’ kampjuni minn distribuzzjoni preċedenti speċifika għall-espressjoni kondizzjonata fuq informazzjoni ta’ espressjoni trasversali, li tippermetti li l-karatteristiċi prosodiċi ġġenerati mis-sistema TTS ikunu relatati mal-kuntest u hija aktar simili għal kif il-bnedmin jipproduċu prosodi b’mod naturali. The performance of CUC-VAE is evaluated via a qualitative listening test for naturalness, intelligibility and quantitative measurements, including word error rates and the standard deviation of prosody attributes.  Riżultati esperimentali dwar id-dejta ta’ LJ-Speech u LibriTTS juru li s-sistema CUC-VAE TTS proposta ttejjeb in-natura u d-diversità tal-prosodi b’marġini ċari.', 'no': 'Modelling av prosody- variasjonar er kritisk for å syntisera naturleg og uttrykk tale i tekst- til- talesystemet til slutt- til- tale (TTS). I denne papiret foreslår ein kryss- uttrykk- conditional VAE (CUC- VAE) for å vurdere ein etter sannsynlighetsfeiling av den latere prosodiske funksjonane for kvar fonema ved å kondisera på akustiske funksjonar, taleinformasjon og tekstfunksjonar som får frå både siste og framtidige setningar. På inferensningstid kan CUC-VAE samlinga frå eit førre distribusjon som er avhengig av kryss-uttaleinformasjon, i staden for standardsdistribusjonen av Gaussian som brukar VAE. Dette gjer det tilgang til å vera tilknytte til konteksten og er meir liknande til korleis mennesker naturleg produserer prosody. CUC-VAE er evaluert med ein kvalitativ lyttest for naturalitet, intelligibilitet og kvantitative målingar, inkludert ordfeilrate og standard avvik av prosody-attributtar. Eksperimentale resultat på LJ-tale og LibriTTS-data viser at den foreslåde CUC-VAE TTS-systemet forbetrar naturalitet og forskjellighet med klare marginar.', 'ml': 'മോഡോളിങ് പ്രോസ്ഡി വേരിഷന്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായും പ്രസ്താവികമായ സംസാരം സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു ക്രിസ്പ്രസ്താവിന്റെ നിശ്ചിത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d (CUC-VAE) പ്രോസ്റ്റിയോര്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പ്രോസോഡിയുടെ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ ഫോണിയുടെയും അടുത്ത വ വിഎയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സാധാരണ ഗസ്സിയന്\u200d വിതരണം പകരം, ക്രിസ്വേഷന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യാപ്തികമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമുമ്പുള്ള വാക്ക്-വിതരണ വ്യവസ്ഥയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന സ്വാഭാവികമായ ശ്രദ്ധ കേള്\u200dക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണം, ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയുള്ള ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിവിശേഷതകള്\u200d, വാക്കിന്റെ തെറ്റിന്റെ വിലപാടും പ്രോസ്ഡിയുടെ സ LJ-സ്പെയിക്കും ലിബ്രിടിടിഎസ് ഡേറ്റായും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു സ്വാഭാവികമായ വ്യത്യാസവും വ്യക്തമാ', 'pl': 'Modelowanie wariacji prozodii ma kluczowe znaczenie dla syntetyzacji naturalnej i ekspresyjnej mowy w kompleksowych systemach tekst-to-mowa (TTS). W niniejszym artykule zaproponowano warunkowe VAE (CUC-VAE) w celu oszacowania tylnego rozkładu prawdopodobieństwa ukrytych cech prozodii dla każdego fonemu poprzez uwarunkowanie cech akustycznych, informacji mówców oraz cech tekstowych uzyskanych zarówno z poprzednich, jak i przyszłych zdań. W czasie wnioskowania, zamiast standardowego rozkładu Gaussowskiego używanego przez VAE, CUC-VAE umożliwia próbkowanie z wcześniejszej dystrybucji specyficznej dla wypowiedzi uwarunkowanej informacją o wypowiedzi krzyżowej, co pozwala na związanie cech prozodii generowanych przez system TTS z kontekstem i jest bardziej podobne do tego, jak ludzie naturalnie produkują prozodię. Wydajność CUC-VAE jest oceniana za pomocą jakościowego testu odsłuchowego pod kątem naturalności, zrozumiałości i pomiarów ilościowych, w tym wskaźników błędów słowa i odchylenia standardowego atrybutów prozodii. Wyniki eksperymentalne z danych LJ-Speech i LibriTTS pokazują, że proponowany system CUC-VAE TTS poprawia naturalność i różnorodność prozodii z wyraźnymi marginesami.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн загварын өөрчлөлт нь байгалийн, илтгэл хөдлөлийн систем дээр мөн төгсгөлийн, илтгэл хөдлөлийн яриаг нэгтгэх нь чухал. Энэ цаасан дээр олон хэлэлцээний шалтгаан VAE (CUC-VAE) нь өмнөх болон ирээдүйн өгүүлбэрээс гарсан текст боломжтой хувилбаруудын дараах магадлал хуваалцах боломжтой хувилбарыг тооцоолж байна. Нөхцөл үед, VAE-н ашигласан стандарт Гаусийн хуваарилалтын оронд CUC-VAE нь олон хэлний мэдээллийн тухай өмнөх хэлбэрээс илүү тодорхой хуваарилалтын тухай үлгэрлэх боломжтой болно. Энэ нь TTS системээс гаргасан шаардлагатай чадваруудыг харьцуулах боломжтой ба хүмүүс байгалийн CUC-VAE-ын үйл ажиллагааг натуралист, ухаантай, хэмжээст хэмжээсүүдийн чадвартай сонсох шалгалтын аргаар дүгнэж, мөн үгийн алдаа хурд болон буруу харилцааны стандарт өөрчлөлт гэсэн үг юм. LJ-яриа болон LibriTTS өгөгдлийн туршилтын үр дүнд CUC-VAE TTS системийн санал дэвшилтэй байгалийн байдал болон сэтгэл хөдлөл байдлыг тодорхой замаар сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Modelarea variației de prosodă este esențială pentru sintetizarea vorbirii naturale și expresive în sistemele end-to-end text-to-speech (TTS). În această lucrare, un VAE condiționat cu pronunțare încrucișată (CUC-VAE) este propus pentru a estima o distribuție posterioară a probabilității caracteristicilor prosodiei latente pentru fiecare fonem prin condiționarea caracteristicilor acustice, a informațiilor despre vorbitor și a caracteristicilor text obținute atât din propozițiile anterioare, cât și din propozițiile viitoare. În momentul inferenței, în loc de distribuția gaussiană standard utilizată de VAE, CUC-VAE permite eșantionarea dintr-o distribuție anterioară specifică rostirii condiționată de informații privind rostirea încrucișată, ceea ce permite caracteristicilor de prosodă generate de sistemul TTS să fie legate de context și este mai similar cu modul în care oamenii produc în mod natural prosodă. Performanța CUC-VAE este evaluată printr-un test calitativ de ascultare pentru măsurători de naturalitate, inteligibilitate și cantitative, inclusiv ratele de eroare a cuvintelor și abaterea standard a atributelor prosodice. Rezultatele experimentale ale datelor LJ-Speech și LibriTTS arată că sistemul TTS CUC-VAE propus îmbunătățește naturalitatea și diversitatea prosodică cu margini clare.', 'sr': 'Modeliranje prosodijske varijacije je kritično za sinteziranje prirodnog i ekspresnog govora u sistemima teksta do govora (TTS). U ovom papiru je predloženo uslovno rečenje VAE (CUC-VAE) proceniti poslednju verovatnoću distribucije poslednjih prokaznih karakteristika za svaku fonemu kondicioniranjem akustičnih karakteristika, informacija o govornici i tekstskih karakteristika koje su dobile od prošlih i budućih rečenica. U vrijeme infekcije, umjesto standardnog Gausijskog distribucije koje koristi VAE, CUC-VAE omogućava uzorke iz prethodne distribucije koje su predstavljene na informacije o prekrasnim rečenicama, koja omogućava da prosodijske funkcije koje su stvorene TTS-om sistemom povezane sa kontekstom i sličnije je na način kako ljudi prirodno proizvode prosodiju. Izvrsnost CUC-VAE procjenjuje se putem kvalitativnog test a slušanja prirodnosti, intelligibilnosti i kvantitativnih mjera, uključujući stope greške riječi i standardnu odstupanju prosodijskih atributa. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima LJ-govora i LibriTTS pokazuju da predloženi sistem CUC-VAE TTS poboljšava prirodnost i prosodijsko raznolikost sa jasnim marginama.', 'so': 'Isbedelka hore ee prosody waa muhiim in la wada ururiyo hadalka dabiicadda iyo expressive ee ugu dambaysta qoraalka-ilaa-dhamaadka (TTS). Qoraalkan waxaa laga soo jeedaa shuruudaha ku saabsan hadalka (CUC-VAE) in laga qiimeeyo qaybsiga suurtagalka ugu dambeeya ee heerarka prosody ee ugu dambeeya ee telefoonka oo dhan, iyadoo ku saabsan sharciga ku saabsan xirfadaha caqliga ah, macluumaadka hadalka iyo waxyaabaha qoraalka ee dhammaadka hore iyo mustaqbalka ah. Waqtiga aan xadeyn waqtiga cayimanta ah ee lagu isticmaali jiray VAE, CUC-VAE wuxuu sameyn karaa tusaale ka horeysa qaybinta sharciga ku saabsan macluumaadka hadalka, kaasoo u ogolaan kara tayada dhimirka ah oo ka soo dhashay nidaamka TTS inay la xiriiraan dabiicadda iyo sida dadku u u dhalo prosody. Dhaqdhaqaaqa CUC-VAE waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa imtixaanka maqalka ee dabiicadda, garashada iyo qiyaastiisa qiyaasta ah, kuwaas oo ah heerka qaladka iyo qalabka caadiga ah ee dhillooyinka. Imtixaanka ku saabsan LJ-Speech iyo LibriTTS macluumaadkooda waxay muujiyaan in nidaamka la soo jeeday CUC-VAE TTS uu kordhiyo dabiicadda iyo kala duwanaanshaha prosody ku jiro marooyin cad.', 'sv': 'Modellering av prosodvariation är avgörande för att syntetisera naturligt och uttrycksfullt tal i end-to-end text-to-tal (TTS) system. I denna uppsats föreslås ett tväryttringsvillkorat VAE (CUC-VAE) för att uppskatta en posterior sannolikhetsfördelning av de latenta prosodifunktionerna för varje fonem genom att konditionera akustiska funktioner, högtalarinformation och textfunktioner som erhållits från både tidigare och framtida meningar. Vid inferenstiden, istället för den gaussiska standarddistribution som används av VAE, tillåter CUC-VAE provtagning från en uttalsspecifik tidigare distribution som är villkorad av korsyttringsinformation, vilket gör det möjligt att relatera prosodfunktionerna som genereras av TTS-systemet till kontexten och är mer likt hur människor naturligt producerar prosody. CUC-VAE:s prestanda utvärderas genom ett kvalitativt lyssningstest för naturlighet, begriplighet och kvantitativa mätningar, inklusive ordfelfrekvens och standardavvikelse för prosodiattribut. Experimentella resultat på LJ-Speech och LibriTTS data visar att det föreslagna CUC-VAE TTS-systemet förbättrar naturlighet och prosodmångfald med tydliga marginaler.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරොසෝඩි වෙනස් මොඩල් කරන්න ප්\u200dරොසෝඩි වෙනස් අන්තිම ප්\u200dරාකෘතික සහ ප්\u200dරාකෘතික කතාවක් සංවිධානය කරන්න සංව මේ පැත්තේ, ක්\u200dරිස්ටර්න්ස් සම්බන්ධතාවක් VAE (CUC-VAE) යුද්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ පොස්ටරියෝ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විතරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විත In Infrence time, in place of the standard Gaussian share Used by VAE, CUC-VAE allows Sampling from an expressance-espezier pre-comparison Condition on on cross-expressance info, that allows the Prosody Featuring generous by the TTS system to be bonded to the Contexts and is more akin to How Humans Naturely make Prosody. CUC-VAE ප්\u200dරභාව විශ්වාස කරනවා ස්වභාවිතාවක් අහන්න පරීක්ෂණයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශ්වාස, තේරුම්ගතාවක් සහ ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශේෂ LJ-කතාව සහ ලිබ්\u200dරිට්ස් දත්තේ පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධතිය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් CUC-VAE TTS පද්ධතිය ස්වභාවිතය සහ ප්\u200dරොසොඩි විවිධ', 'ta': 'முடிவில் இருந்து முடிவில் உரையில் இருந்து பேச்சு முறைமைகளில் இயல்பான மற்றும் வெளிப்பாட்டின் பேச்சை ஒன்றிசைக் இந்த காகிதத்தில், ஒரு சுற்று சொல்லும் நிபந்தனை VAE (CUC- VAE) பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது கடந்த மற்றும் எதிர்காலத்தின் வாக்கியங்களில் இருந்தும் பெறப்பட்ட உரை குணங்கள் மூலம் ஒவ்வொரு த குறைந்தபட்ச நேரத்தில், VAE பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட இயல்பான காஸ்சியன் பங்கீட்டு பதிலாக, CUC-VAE மாதிரி சொல்ல- குறிப்பிட்ட முன்னால் பங்கீடு தகவல் மீது நிலைமையிலிருந்து மாதிரி அனுமதிக்கிறது,  CUC-VAE செயல்கூறு இயற்கையின், புலனியல் மற்றும் அளவு அளவுகளுக்கான செவிமடுப்பு செவிமடுப்பு சோதனையின் மூலம் மதிப்பிடும், சொல் பிழை விகிதம் மற்றும் ப LJ- பேச்சு மற்றும் லிப்ரிடிடிஸ் தகவல் மீது சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் தெளிவான ஓரங்களுடன் திருப்பப்பட்ட CUC- VAE TTS அமைப்பு தானானத்தை மேம', 'ur': 'نمڈلینگ پرسوڈی تغییر سیسٹم میں طبیعی اور مثبت بات کا سامان کرنے کے لئے ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں ایک کروس-کلانس کنڈیشن VAE (CUC-VAE) کی تقدیر کی جاتی ہے کہ ہر فونیم کے لئے لاٹینٹ پرسوڈی ویٹیوں کی نسبت احتمالات تقسیم کرے، آکوستیک ویٹیوں، اسپیکر معلومات، اور پیچھے اور آیندہ ویٹیوں سے پائی جاتی ہیں۔ فائرنس زمان میں، VAE کے ذریعہ استاندارڈ گاوسی تقسیم کے بدلے CUC-VAE اس بات کے مطابق مختلف تقسیم معلومات پر قائم ہونے کے قائم ہونے کے مطابق مختلف پھیلانے سے نمونپل کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے جو TTS سیستم سے پیدا ہوا پروسڈی فکرتوں کی اجازت دیتا ہے کہ کانٹس کے ساتھ رابطہ ہو اور انسان CUC-VAE کی فعالیت کو طبیعت، عقل اور مقدار اندازے کے لئے ایک کیلوٹیٹی سننے کی امتحان کے ذریعہ مطالب کیا جاتا ہے، کلمات کی خطا رات اور استاندارڈ ڈھیر کے متعلق۔ LJ-Speech اور LibriTTS ڈیٹا پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد CUC-VAE TTS سیسٹم نے طبیعت اور پرسوڈی مختلفیت کو صریح محدودیت کے ساتھ بہتر کیا ہے.', 'uz': 'Name Bu qogʻozda, bizning past va kelajakdagi gaplarga olingan matn xossalarini qiymatlashtirish imkoniyatlarini anglatadi. At inference time, instead of the standard Gaussian distribution used by VAE, CUC-VAE allows sampling from an utterance-specific prior distribution conditioned on cross-utterance information, which allows the prosody features generated by the TTS system to be related to the context and is more similar to how humans naturally produce prosody.  Name Name', 'vi': 'Sự biến đổi giai đoạn mới là điều quan trọng cho hệ thống tổng hợp ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và biểu tượng trong hệ thống văn-sang-ngôn-ngữ (TTP). Trong tờ giấy này, một biến dạng phụ thuộc thuộc thuộc hoàn to àn đọc tách tách (CUPS-VAE) được đề xuất để ước lượng xác suất sau lưng phân phối các tính năng phát triển tiềm ẩn của cơ thể phát triển cho mỗi phiên bản bằng cách điều chỉnh các tính năng âm, thông tin loa, và các tính năng văn bản lấy từ cả câu trước và sau. Vào lúc luận tội, thay vì phân phối kiểu Gauss được dùng bởi VAE, CUC-VAE cho phép lấy mẫu từ một phân phối cấp trước đặc biệt nhờ các thông tin cắt lời, mà cho phép các tính chất nhà chứa tạo ra từ hệ thống TTP được liên kết với ngữ cảnh và giống hơn là cách con người tự nhiên sản sinh sản xuất giai đoạn văn. Các hiệu quả của CUPS-VAE được đánh giá qua một thử nghiệm lắng nghe về tính chất, trí thức và các đo số lượng, bao gồm tỉ lệ lỗi từ và độ lệch tiêu chuẩn của các thuộc tính của thể thao. Kết quả thử nghiệm về dữ liệu LJ-Speech và Librity cho thấy rằng hệ thống CUC-VAE RTS dự kiến cải thiện tính chất và độ đa dạng gia thể với khoảng cách rõ ràng.', 'nl': 'Het modelleren van prosodivariatie is cruciaal voor het synthetiseren van natuurlijke en expressieve spraak in end-to-end tekst-to-speech (TTS)-systemen. In dit artikel wordt een voorwaardelijke VAE (CUC-VAE) voorgesteld om een latere waarschijnlijkheidsverdeling van de latente prosodiekenmerken voor elk foneem te schatten door te conditioneren op akoestische kenmerken, sprekerinformatie en tekstkenmerken verkregen uit zowel eerdere als toekomstige zinnen. Op het moment van inferentie, in plaats van de standaard Gaussiaanse distributie gebruikt door VAE, staat CUC-VAE sampling toe uit een uitingsspecifieke voorafgaande distributie die is geconditioneerd op cross-uitingsinformatie, waardoor de prosodiekenmerken gegenereerd door het TTS-systeem gerelateerd zijn aan de context en meer vergelijkbaar zijn met hoe mensen op natuurlijke wijze prosodie produceren. De prestaties van CUC-VAE worden geëvalueerd door middel van een kwalitatieve luistertest voor natuurlijkheid, verstaanbaarheid en kwantitatieve metingen, inclusief woordfouten en de standaardafwijking van prosodiekenmerken. Experimentele resultaten op LJ-Speech en LibriTTS data tonen aan dat het voorgestelde CUC-VAE TTS systeem de natuurlijkheid en prosodiëndiversiteit verbetert met duidelijke marges.', 'bg': 'Моделирането на вариацията на прозодите е от решаващо значение за синтезирането на естествена и изразителна реч в системите от край до край текст в реч. В тази статия се предлага условно кръстосано изказване (CUC-VAE), за да се оцени последващото вероятностно разпределение на латентните прозоди характеристики за всеки фонем, като се обуславят акустични характеристики, информация за говорителя и текстови характеристики, получени от минали и бъдещи изречения. По време на заключение, вместо стандартното гаусско разпределение, използвано от VAE, CUC-VAE позволява вземане на проби от специфично за изказване предварително разпределение, обусловено на информация за кръстосаните изказвания, което позволява характеристиките на прозодите, генерирани от системата TTS, да бъдат свързани с контекста и е по-подобно на начина, по който хората естествено произвеждат прозодия. Ефективността на CUC-VAE се оценява чрез качествен изслушващ тест за естественост, разбираемост и количествени измервания, включително степента на думична грешка и стандартното отклонение на атрибутите на прозодите. Експерименталните резултати на данните показват, че предложената система подобрява естествеността и прозодийното разнообразие с ясни граници.', 'da': "Modellering af prosodvariation er afgørende for at syntetisere naturlig og udtryksfuld tale i end-to-end tekst-til-tale (TTS) systemer. I dette arbejde foreslås en krydssudstående betinget VAE (CUC-VAE) til at estimere en efterfølgende sandsynlighedsfordeling af latente prosodyfunktioner for hvert fonem ved at betinge akustiske funktioner, højttalerinformation og tekstfunktioner opnået fra både tidligere og fremtidige sætninger. I stedet for den gaussiske standardfordeling, der anvendes af VAE, tillader CUC-VAE ved slutningstidspunktet prøveudtagning fra en ytringsspecifik forudgående fordeling betinget af krydsudtalelsesinformation, hvilket gør det muligt at relatere prosodegenskaberne genereret af TTS-systemet til konteksten og ligner mere den måde, hvorpå mennesker naturligt producerer prosody. CUC-VAE's ydeevne vurderes ved hjælp af en kvalitativ lyttetest for naturlighed, forståelighed og kvantitative målinger, herunder ordfejlfrekvenser og standardafvigelsen af prosody attributter. Eksperimentelle resultater på LJ-Speech og LibriTTS data viser, at det foreslåede CUC-VAE TTS system forbedrer naturlighed og prosody diversitet med klare marginer.", 'de': 'Die Modellierung von Prosodieveränderungen ist entscheidend für die Synthese natürlicher und expressiver Sprache in End-to-End Text-to-Speech (TTS)-Systemen. In dieser Arbeit wird eine Cross-Outerance Conditional VAE (CUC-VAE) vorgeschlagen, um eine posteriore Wahrscheinlichkeitsverteilung der latenten Prosodie Merkmale für jedes Phonem durch Konditionierung auf akustische Merkmale, Sprecherinformationen und Textmerkmale aus vergangenen und zukünftigen Sätzen zu schätzen. Zum Zeitpunkt der Inferenz erlaubt CUC-VAE anstelle der von VAE verwendeten Gaußschen Standardverteilung Abtastung aus einer äußerungsspezifischen vorherigen Verteilung, die auf Cross-Äußerungsinformationen konditioniert ist, was es erlaubt, die durch das TTS-System generierten Prosodiemerkmale mit dem Kontext in Beziehung zu setzen und ähnlicher ist, wie Menschen auf natürliche Weise Prosodie produzieren. Die Leistungsfähigkeit von CUC-VAE wird mittels eines qualitativen Hörtests auf Natürlichkeit, Verständlichkeit und quantitative Messungen einschließlich Wortfehlerraten und Standardabweichung von Prosodie-Attributen bewertet. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an LJ-Speech und LibriTTS Daten zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene CUC-VAE TTS System die Natürlichkeit und Prosodienvielfalt mit klaren Margen verbessert.', 'id': 'Modeling variasi prosody adalah kritis untuk sintesis pidato alami dan ekspresif dalam sistem end-to-end text-to-speech (TTS). Dalam kertas ini, sebuah VAE (CUC-VAE) kondisional salib ucapan diusulkan untuk memperkirakan distribusi kemungkinan posterior dari fitur prosody latent untuk setiap fonem dengan kondisi pada fitur akustik, informasi pembicara, dan fitur teks yang diperoleh dari kalimat masa lalu dan masa depan. Pada waktu inferensi, selain distribusi Gaussi standar yang digunakan oleh VAE, CUC-VAE memungkinkan sampel dari distribusi sebelumnya yang spesifik-utterance berkonditionasi pada informasi salib utterance, yang memungkinkan fitur prosody yang dihasilkan oleh sistem TTS untuk berhubungan dengan konteks dan lebih mirip dengan bagaimana manusia secara alami menghasilkan prosody. Performasi CUC-VAE dievaluasi melalui tes pendengaran kualitatif untuk alami, inteligibilitas dan pengukuran kuantitatif, termasuk kadar kesalahan kata dan deviasi standar atribut prosody. Hasil percobaan pada data LJ-Speech dan LibriTTS menunjukkan bahwa sistem CUC-VAE TTS yang diusulkan meningkatkan alam dan kebanyakan kebanyakan dengan margin yang jelas.', 'ko': '끝에서 끝까지 텍스트에서 음성(TTS) 시스템에서 운율 변화 모델링은 자연스럽고 표현력 있는 음성을 합성하는 데 매우 중요하다.본고는 조건화 성학적 특징, 말하는 사람의 정보와 과거와 미래 문장에서 얻은 텍스트 특징을 통해 각 음소의 잠재적 운율 특징의 검증 확률 분포를 추정하는 다중 언어 조건VAE(CUC-VAE)를 제시했다.추리할 때VAE가 사용하는 표준 고스 분포와 달리 CUC-VAE는 교차 언어 정보에 따라 특정한 언어의 선험 분포에서 샘플링을 허용한다. 이로써 TTS시스템이 생성하는 운율 특징은 상하문과 관련되고 인류가 자연적으로 운율을 형성하는 방식과 유사하다.CUC-VAE의 성능은 단어 오류율과 운율 속성의 표준 편차를 포함한 자연도, 이해성, 정량 측정의 정성 듣기 테스트를 통해 평가된다.LJ음성과 LibritTS 데이터에 대한 실험 결과 제시된 CUC-VAE TTS 시스템은 자연도와 운율의 다양성을 높여 뚜렷한 변두리를 가지고 있음을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'تغییرات مدل\u200cبندی پیشنهاد برای تنظیم سخنرانی طبیعی و استفاده در سیستم\u200cهای متن-به-سخنرانی (TTS) مهم است. در این کاغذ، یک شرایط متفاوتی VAE (CUC-VAE) پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که تقسیم احتمال پشتیبانی از ویژه\u200cهای پیشنهاد اخیر برای هر تلفن را با توجه به ویژه\u200cهای آکوستیک، اطلاعات صحبت کننده و ویژه\u200cهای متن از جمله گذشته و آینده دریافت می\u200cشود. در زمان بیماری، به جای توزیع استاندارد گاوسی که توسط VAE استفاده می\u200cشود، CUC-VAE اجازه می\u200cدهد نمونه\u200cبندی از توزیع پیشینیان ویژه\u200cای که در اطلاعات متفاوتی است، که اجازه می\u200cدهد ویژه\u200cهای پیشینیان توسط سیستم TTS تولید شده باشد با موضوع ارتباط داشته باشد و شبیه\u200cتر است که انسان به طور طبیع عملکرد CUC-VAE از طریق یک آزمایش گوش کردن کیفیت برای طبیعت، عقل و اندازه اندازه\u200cهای اندازه\u200cگیری، شامل نرخ خطای کلمه\u200cها و تغییر استاندارد ویژه\u200cهای پیشنهاد ارزیابی می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی داده\u200cهای LJ-Speech و LibriTTS نشان می\u200cدهد که سیستم CUC-VAE TTS پیشنهاد مختلف طبیعت و پیشنهاد با مرزهای روشن بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya uzalishaji ya prosody ni muhimu kwa kukusanyika na hotuba ya asili na ya wazi katika mfumo wa kujieleza kwa mwisho wa maandishi na hadi mwishoni (TTS). Katika karatasi hii, inapendekezwa kudhani uwezekano wa usambazaji wa mazoea ya hivi karibuni kwa kila simu kwa kuweka mazingira ya kiuchunguzi, taarifa za mazungumzo na vifaa vya maandishi vinavyopatikana kutoka katika hukumu za nyuma na baadaye. Wakati wa uchunguzi, badala ya usambazaji wa kawaida wa Gaussia uliotumiwa na VAE, CUC-VAE inaruhusu sampuli kutoka kwa mazungumzo maalum kabla ya usambazaji wa mazungumzo yanayohusiana na taarifa za kupiga maneno, ambazo zinaruhusu sifa za prosadi zilizotengenezwa na mfumo wa TTS kuhusiana na muktadha na ni sawa na jinsi binadamu wanavyozalisha prosody kwa asili. Utendaji wa CUC-VAE unapitishwa kupitia jaribio la kusikiliza kwa asili, ufahamu na vipimo vya kiasi, ikiwa ni pamoja na kiwango cha makosa ya neno na kubadilishana kwa vifaa vya prosadi. Matokeo ya majaribio juu ya data za LJ-Hotuba na LibriTTS yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wa TTS pendekezo wa CUC-VAE unaongezea utofauti wa asili na taratibu za kimapenzi kwa viwanja vibaya.', 'sq': 'Modelling prosody variation is critical for synthesizing natural and expressive speech in end-to-end text-to-speech (TTS) systems.  Në këtë letër, propozohet një VAE kushtëzuese ndër-shprehje (CUC-VAE) për të vlerësuar një shpërndarje të mundësisë së pasme të karakteristikave të prosodisë së fshehtë për çdo telefonim duke kushtëzuar në karakteristika akustike, informacion për zëdhënësit dhe karakteristika teksti të marrë nga fjalët e kaluara dhe të ardhshme. Në kohën e përfundimit, në vend të shpërndarjes standarte Gausiane të përdorur nga VAE, CUC-VAE lejon marrjen e mostrave nga një shpërndarje e mëparshme specifike për shprehje të kushtuar nga informacioni ndër-shprehje, i cili lejon që karakteristikat e prosodisë të gjeneruar nga sistemi TTS të lidhen me kontekstin dhe është më i ngjashëm me mënyrën se si njerëzit prodhojnë natyralisht prosodi. Performanca e CUC-VAE vlerësohet nëpërmjet një testi kualitativ dëgjimi për natyrën, inteligjencën dhe matjet kuantitative, duke përfshirë normat e gabimeve të fjalës dhe devijimin standard të atributeve të prosodisë. Rezultatet eksperimentale mbi të dhënat LJ-Speech dhe LibriTTS tregojnë se sistemi i propozuar CUC-VAE TTS përmirëson natyrën dhe diversitetin e prosody me margine të qarta.', 'af': "Modelering van prosody veranderinge is kritiese vir sintetisering van natuurlike en uitdrukklike woord in die end- to- end text- to- speech (TTS) stelsels. In hierdie papier is 'n kruis-uitspraak voorwaardes VAE (CUC-VAE) voorgestel om 'n posterior waarskynlikheid verspreiding van die latente voorwaardes funksies vir elke foneme te vurig deur voorwaardes op akustiese funksies, sprekker inligting en teks funksies van beide verlede en toekomstige setinge te verkry. By inferensie tyd, in plaas van die standaard Gaussian verspreiding gebruik deur VAE, CUC-VAE laat toe versameling van 'n uitspraak-spesifieke vooraf verspreiding conditioneer op kruis-uitspraak inligting, wat toelaat die prosody funksies genereer deur die TTS stelsel na wees verwante aan die konteks en is meer gelykbaar aan hoe mense natuurlik prosody produseer. Die prestasie van CUC-VAE is uitgewerk deur 'n kwaliteit luister toets vir natuurlikheid, intelligibiliteit en kvantitatiewe measurements, insluitend woord fout rate en die standaard afwyking van prosody eienskappe. Eksperimentale resultate op LJ-Spraak en LibriTTS data vertoon dat die voorgestelde CUC-VAE TTS stelsel natuurlikheid en prosody verskeidigheid met duidelike marge verbeter.", 'tr': "Adaty üýtgeşikleri tebigy we ifade edilen sözleri (TTS) sistemlerinde synthesize etmek üçin wajyp däldir. Bu kagyzda, akustik möhümlerde, sözler maglumaty we gelejek sözleriň hem geçmişden hem bolsa sözleriň içinde alan soňky sözler möhümliklikleriniň peňki sözlerini tassyklamak üçin ullanýar. At inference time, instead of the standard Gaussian distribution used by VAE, CUC-VAE allows sampling from an utterance-specific prior distribution conditioned on cross-utterance information, which allows the prosody features generated by the TTS system to be related to the context and is more similar to how humans naturally produce prosody. CUC-VAE'nin etkinliği doğal, akıllık ve miktarlik ölçümleri için kaliteli dinleme testi üzerinden değerlendirildir, kelime hata hızları ve prosody özelliklerinin standart değerlendirilmesi dahil edildi. LJ-söz we LibriTTS maglumatynda örän netijesi CUC-VAE TTS sisteminiň dogrudylyk we öňünden aýratyn gabdalyklary bilen üýtgedýändigini görkez.", 'am': 'የፖስዲዮ መለያየት ፍጥረታዊ እና የድምፅ ንግግር በተጨማሪው የጽሑፍ-ወደ-መጨረሻ ንግግር (TTS) systems በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቋንቋ አካባቢ VAE (CUC-VAE) የቀድሞው የፕሮጀዲ ምርጫዎች ለየፎፎቶ አካባቢ፣ የንግግር መረጃ እና የጽሑፍ ምርጫዎች ከቀድሞው እና በቀድሞው ፍርድ ላይ የተገኘውን የጽሑፍ ውጤቶች ማካሰናከል የተፈቀደ ነው፡፡ በክፍለ ዘመን፣ VAE በተጠቃሚ ጋዜኛ ክፍተት ፋንታ CUC-VAE በተለየ ቋንቋ መረጃ ላይ በተለየ ከንግግር ግንኙነት አስቀድሞ መክፈቻን ይፈቅዳል፤ ይህም የTTS ስርዓት በተለየ ፕሮጀዲዮ ፍትሕቶችን ከግንኙነት ጋር እንዲተባበር ይፈቅዳል፡፡ The performance of CUC-VAE is evaluated via a qualitative listening test for naturalness, intelligibility and quantitative measurements, including word error rates and the standard deviation of prosody attributes.  የLJ-ቋንቋ እና የLibriTTS ዳታ የፈተና ውጤቶች የCUC-VAE TTS ስርዓት ፍጥረት እና የፕሮጀክት ልዩነትን በተለየ ግንኙነት እንዲያሳድግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hr': 'Modeliranje prosodijske varijacije je kritično za sinteziranje prirodnog i izrazitog govora u sustavima teksta do govora (TTS). U ovom papiru je predloženo uvjetno raspoređenje VAE (CUC-VAE) procijeniti posljednju verovatnoću distribucije posljednjih prosodijskih karakteristika za svaku fonemu uvjetom akustičnih karakteristika, informacija o govornici i tekstskih karakteristika koji su dobili od prošlih i budućih kazna. U vrijeme infekcije, umjesto standardnog Gausijskog distribucije koje koristi VAE, CUC-VAE omogućava uzorke iz prethodne distribucije koje su specifične za izraz pod uvjetom prijevoznih informacija, što omogućava prosodijskim karakteristikama koje su proizvodili sustav TTS-a da budu povezani s kontekstom i sličnije je tome kako ljudi prirodno proizvode prosodiju. Učinnost CUC-VAE procjenjuje se kvalitativnim ispitivanjem slušanja prirodnosti, intelligibilnosti i kvantitativnih mjera, uključujući stope greške riječi i standardnu odstupanju prosodijskih atributa. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima LJ-govora i LibriTTS pokazuju da predloženi sustav CUC-VAE TTS-a poboljšava prirodnost i prosodijsko raznolikost s čistim marginama.', 'hy': "Մոդելավորել պրոզիդիայի տարբերակը կարևոր է բնական և արտահայտության խոսքի սինթեզման համար վերջ-վերջ տեքստ-խոսքի (ՏՏՍ) համակարգերում: Այս թղթի մեջ առաջարկում է հակառակ արտահայտություն պայմանավոր ՎԵ (CuC-VaE) արտահայտությունը, որպեսզի հաշվարկի ամեն հեռախոսի համար թաքնված մարմնի առանձնահատկությունների հետագա հավանականությունը' կախված լինելով ձայնային առանձնահատկությունների, խոսացողի տեղեկատվության և տեքստի առա Հետեւանքների ժամանակ, փոխարենը ստանդարտ գաուսական տարածումը, որը օգտագործվում է ՎԵ-ի կողմից, CuC-ՎԵ-ը թույլ է տալիս նմուշներ վերցնել արտահայտությամբ հատուկ նախկին տարածումից, որը պայմանավորված է խաչը արտահայտությամբ տեղեկատվության վրա, ինչը թույլ է տալիս, որ ԹԹՍ համակարգի ստեղ Cuc-VaE-ի արտադրողությունը գնահատվում է բնական, հասկանալի և քանակական չափումների որակային լսողական փորձի միջոցով, ներառյալ բառերի սխալման արագությունը և պրոդիոդի առանձնահատկությունների ստանդարտ շեղումը: LJ Speech-ի և գրադարանի տվյալների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված CuC-Vae-ի ԹԹՍ համակարգը բարելավում է բնական էությունը և բարեկեցության բազմազանությունը պարզ արժեքներով:", 'az': 'Model prosody dəyişiklikləri təbiətli və ifadəli sözləri sona-sona-sona-sözlə-sözlə (TTS) sistemlərində sintezləmək üçün kritik olar. Bu kağızda, acoustic özellikləri, danışmaq məlumatları və gələcək cümlələrdən alınan metin özellikləri ilə hər fonema üçün son prosody özelliklərinin sonrakı ehtimalının dağıtılmasını təmin edir. VAE vasitəsilə istifadə edilən standart Gaussian dağıtımın yerinə CUC-VAE dağıtıcılıq məlumatlarına istifadə edir. Bu, TTS sistemindən yaratdığı prosody xüsusiyyətlərin məlumatlarına bağlı olmasına və insanların doğal olaraq prosody ürəklərinə bənzəyir. CUC-VAE performansı, doğallıq, intelligibility və kvantitatlı ölçülər üçün qabilitatlı dinləmə sınaması vasitəsilə değerlənir, söz xəta hüquqları və prosody əlamətlərinin standart tərzini də dahil edər. LJ-Speech və LibriTTS məlumatının təcrübəsi sonuçları CUC-VAE TTS sisteminin təbiətli təbiəti və prosody müxtəlifliyini açıq sınırları ilə yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'মোডেলিং প্রোসোডি ভেরিয়েশন প্রাকৃতিক এবং প্রকাশ্য ভাষণ সমানিত করার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। এই কাগজটিতে প্রস্তাব করা হচ্ছে একটি ক্রস-বাক্যের পরিস্থিতি ভিয়াই (সিউসি-ভিয়াই) প্রত্যেক ফোনের জন্য সাম্প্রতিক প্রস্তাবিক সম্ভাবনা বিতরণের সম্ভাবনা নির্ধারণ করার জন্য। ভিউসিয়ার স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার গ্যাসিয়ান বিতরণের পরিবর্তে সিউসি-ভিয়াই ব্যবহার করা একটি শব্দ-বিশেষ বিতরণ ব্যবস্থা থেকে উদাহরণ করতে পারে, যার ফলে টিটিএস সিস্টেমের তৈরি প্রোসোডি বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে  সিউসি-ভিয়ার কর্মকাণ্ডের পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে স্বাভাবিক, বুদ্ধিবিজ্ঞান এবং পরিমাপের মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে শব্দের ত্রুটির হার এবং প্র এলজে- ভাষা এবং লিব্রিটিটিটিএস তথ্যের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত সিউসি-ভিয়াই টিটিএস সিস্টেম পরিষ্কার প্রাকৃতিক এবং প্', 'ca': "La variació de la prosòpia de modelació és crítica per sintetitzar el discurs natural i expressiu en sistemes de text a text (TTS). En aquest paper, es propone una VAE condicional de frase cruzada (CUC-VAE) per estimar una distribució posterior de probabilitat de les característiques de prosodi latent per cada fonem condicionant-se amb característiques acústiques, informació del parlant i característiques de text obtenides tant de frases passades com futures. En el moment de la inferència, en comptes de la distribució gaussia estàndard utilitzada per VAE, CUC-VAE permet la mostra d'una distribució anterior específica d'expressió condicionada per informació cruzada d'expressió, que permet que les característiques de prosodi generades pel sistema TTS siguin relacionades amb el context i és més similar a com els humans produeixen naturalment prosodi. El rendiment de CUC-VAE es valora a través d'una prova d'escolta qualitativa per a la naturalesa, la intel·ligibilitat i les mesures quantitatives, incloent els índics d'error de paraules i la desviació estándar dels atributs de prosoditat. Experimental results on LJ-Speech and LibriTTS data show that the proposed CUC-VAE TTS system improves naturalness and prosody diversity with clear margins.", 'cs': 'Modelování variace prozodií je klíčové pro syntetizaci přirozené a expresivní řeči v komplexních systémech text-to-speech (TTS). V tomto článku je navržena křížová podmíněná VAE (CUC-VAE) k odhadu zadního rozložení pravděpodobnosti latentních prozodií pro každý foném podmíněním akustických prvků, informací řečníka a textových prvků získaných z minulých i budoucích vět. V době závěru umožňuje CUC-VAE namísto standardní Gaussovské distribuce používané VAE vzorkování z předchozí distribuce specifické pro výrok podmíněné informací o křížových výrokech, což umožňuje, aby prvky prozodií generované systémem TTS souvisely s kontextem a je více podobné tomu, jak lidé přirozeně produkují prozodii. Výkonnost CUC-VAE je hodnocena kvalitativním poslechovým testem pro přirozenost, srozumitelnost a kvantitativní měření, včetně míry chyb slova a směrodatné odchylky atributů prozodií. Experimentální výsledky na LJ-Speech a LibriTTS data ukazují, že navržený CUC-VAE TTS systém zlepšuje přirozenost a prozodii diverzitu s jasnými okraji.', 'bs': 'Modeliranje prosodijske varijacije je kritično za sinteziranje prirodnog i izrazitog govora u sistemima teksta do govora (TTS). U ovom papiru je predloženo uvjetno raspoređenje VAE (CUC-VAE) procijeniti kasniju verovatnoću distribucije poslednjih prosodijskih karakteristika za svaku fonemu uvjetom akustičnih karakteristika, informacija o govornicima i karakteristika teksta koji su dobili od prošlih i budućih kazna. U vrijeme infekcije, umjesto standardne Gausijske distribucije koje koristi VAE, CUC-VAE omogućava uzorke iz prethodne distribucije koje su specifične za rečenje uvjetne o informacijama o prekovršenom izrazu, što omogućava da prosodijske funkcije koje su stvorene sustav TTS-a povezane sa kontekstom i sličnije na način kako ljudi prirodno proizvode prosodiju. Učinnost CUC-VAE procjenjuje se putem kvalitativnog test a slušanja prirodnosti, inteligencije i kvantitativnih mjera, uključujući stope greške riječi i standardnu odstupanju prosodijskih atributa. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima LJ-govora i LibriTTS pokazuju da predloženi sistem CUC-VAE TTS poboljšava prirodnost i prosodijsko raznolikost sa jasnim marginama.', 'et': 'Prosoodia variatsiooni modelleerimine on kriitilise tähtsusega loomuliku ja ekspressiivse kõne sünteesimiseks lõpust lõpuni tekst kõneks (TTS) süsteemides. Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja ristkõne tingimuslik VAE (CUC-VAE), et hinnata iga foneemi latentse prosoodia funktsioonide hilisemat tõenäosusjaotust, tingides akustilisi funktsioone, kõlariteavet ja tekstifunktsioone, mis saadakse nii varasematest kui ka tulevastest lausetest. Järelduse ajal võimaldab CUC-VAE standardse Gaussi jaotuse asemel võtta proove väljendusspetsiifilisest eelnevast jaotusest, mis sõltub ristkõnede andmetest, mis võimaldab TTS-süsteemi poolt loodud prosoodia omadusi seostada kontekstiga ja sarnaneb rohkem sellega, kuidas inimesed looduslikult prosoodiat toodavad. CUC-VAE jõudlust hinnatakse loomulikkuse, arusaadavuse ja kvantitatiivsete mõõtmiste kvalitatiivse kuulamise testi kaudu, sealhulgas sõnavara määra ja prosoodia atribuutide standardhälve kaudu. LJ-Speech ja LibriTTS andmete eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud CUC-VAE TTS süsteem parandab loomulikkust ja prosoodia mitmekesisust selgete marginaalidega.', 'fi': 'Prosodiavariaation mallintaminen on ratkaisevan tärkeää luonnollisen ja ilmaisuvoimaisen puheen syntetisoinnissa end-to-speech (TTS) -järjestelmissä. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan ristilauseen ehdollista VAE (CUC-VAE) arvioimaan latenttien prosodia-ominaisuuksien myöhempää todennäköisyysjakaumaa kullekin foneemille ehdollistamalla akustisia ominaisuuksia, puhujatietoja ja tekstiominaisuuksia, jotka on saatu sekä menneistä että tulevista lauseista. Johtoajankohtana CUC-VAE mahdollistaa VAE:n käyttämän vakiogaussilaisen jakauman sijaan näytteenoton lausespesifisestä aikaisemmasta jakaumasta, joka perustuu ristiintulotietoihin, mikä mahdollistaa TTS-järjestelmän synnyttämien prosodiaominaisuuksien kytkemisen kontekstiin ja muistuttaa enemmän sitä, miten ihmiset luonnollisesti tuottavat prosodiaa. CUC-VAE:n suorituskykyä arvioidaan kvalitatiivisella kuuntelutestillä luonnollisuuden, ymmärrettävyyden ja kvantitatiivisten mittausten osalta, mukaan lukien sanavirheprosentit ja prosodiaattribuuttien keskihajonta. Kokeelliset tulokset LJ-Speech- ja LibriTTS-aineistosta osoittavat, että ehdotettu CUC-VAE TTS-järjestelmä parantaa luonnollisuutta ja prosodiamonimuotoisuutta selkein marginaalein.', 'sk': 'Modeliranje variacije prosodije je ključnega pomena za sintetizacijo naravnega in ekspresivnega govora v sistemih od konca do konca besedila v govor (TTS). V tem prispevku je predlagana navzkrižna pogojna VAE (CUC-VAE) za oceno naknadne verjetnostne porazdelitve latentnih prosodij za vsak fonem s pogojem na akustičnih značilnostih, informacijah zvočnikov in besedilnih značilnostih, pridobljenih iz preteklih in prihodnjih stavkov. V času sklepanja CUC-VAE namesto standardne gausijske porazdelitve, ki jo uporablja VAE, omogoča vzorčenje iz predhodne porazdelitve, specifične za izgovor, pogojene na podlagi informacij o navzkrižnem izgovoru, kar omogoča, da so prosodije, ki jih ustvarja sistem TTS, povezane z kontekstom in je bolj podobno, kako ljudje naravno proizvajajo prosodijo. Učinkovitost CUC-VAE se ocenjuje s kvalitativnim poslušalnim testom za naravnost, razumljivost in kvantitativne meritve, vključno s stopnjami besednih napak in standardnim odklonom atributov prosodije. Poskusni rezultati podatkov LJ-Speech in LibriTTS kažejo, da predlagani sistem CUC-VAE TTS izboljšuje naravnost in prosodično raznolikost z jasnimi robovi.', 'he': 'שינוי מודל של פרוסודיה הוא קריטי לסינטזיה של נאום טבעי ומביע במערכות טקסט-לנאום (TTS). בעיתון הזה, מוצע VAE (CUC-VAE) תחת מילוי הצלב (cross-utterance conditional VAE) כדי להעריך פיצוי סבירות מאחורי של תכונות הפרוזודיה המסתורים לכל טלפונים על ידי שילוי על תכונות אקוסטיות, מידע הרמקול, ומתכונות טקסט שנקבלו משפטים עברים ובעתידים. בזמן ההנחה, במקום ההפצה הסטנדרטית הגאוסית השתמשת על ידי VAE, CUC-VAE מאפשר דגימות מהפצה קודמת ספציפית למילה מונחת על מידע הצלב, אשר מאפשר את תכונות הפרוסודיה שנוצרו ע"י מערכת TTS להיות קשורות לקונקסט והיא דומה יותר לאיך בני האדם יוצרים באופן טבעי פרוסדיה. ביצועים של CUC-VAE מוערכים באמצעות בדיקת הקשיבה איכותית לטבע, הבנה ומדידות כמוניות, כולל שיעורי שגיאות מילים וההתנועה הסטנדרטית של תכונות פרוסודיה. תוצאות ניסויים על מידע LJ-Speech ו LibriTTS מראות כי מערכת CUC-VAE TTS המוצעת משפר את הטבע ומגווון פרוסודי עם גבולות ברורים.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepulan iki, diwisiyun CUC-VE (CUC-VE) supoyo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerasai supoyantane kapan mulasakno sing wis dipolete kanggo sabên kelas akustik karo mulasakno, informasi layakno lan gambar tekan kelas nggawe kapan mulasakno iki dadi. Slackfree Cut Reulti sing paling nggambar Lj-Kebebasan lan Library iTTS data ngomong nik nggawe sistem CUC-VE TTS supoyo kanggo ngerayakno duluran kanggo ngerayakno kanggo ngerayakno kesempatan.', 'ha': "@ action: button A cikin wannan takardan, aka buɗa wani sharri na faɗi (CUC-V AU) wa'anar ƙayyade rabon sharuɗori na ƙarshen masu tsari na masu saurãre wa kowace na hoton, da muhalli masu husũma na haske, da masu faɗi da mazaɓa da matsayin wanda aka samu da bakin da na gaba da bakin. A lokacin da aka faɗa shi, ana yarda da misalin tarawa na Gaussian da aka yi amfani da shi na nau'in Gaussian a yi amfani da shi, CUC-vAU yana yarda da misali daga wani misalin-faɗi wanda aka ƙayyade shi a kan bayanin-faɗi, wanda ya yarda da wasu mistakardar mutane da aka buɗe na tsarin TSS da ya yi haɗa da mazaunin, kuma yana daidai kamar yadda mutane ke sami mutane a naturally. The performance of CUC-VAE is evaluated via a qualitative listening test for naturalness, intelligibility and quantitative measurements, including word error rates and the standard deviation of prosody attributes.  Matarinta na jarraba kan data na LJS-Speak da LibrittS za'a nuna cewa, na'urar CUC-vAET TS da aka buƙata, yana ƙaranci tsarin natura da mazaɓa da mutane da takin bayani.", 'bo': 'Modeling prosody variation is critical for synthesizing natural and expressive speech in end-to-end text-to-speech (TTS) systems. ཤོག Infrence time, instead of the standard Gaussian distribution used by VAE, CUC-VAE allows sampling from an utterance-specific distribution conditioned on cross-utterance information, which allows the prosody features generated by the TTS system to be related to the context and is more similar to how humans naturally produce prosody. CUC-VAE ཡི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་འདི་naturalness, intelligibility and quantitative measurements་ལ་qualitative listening test for naturalness , intelligibility and quantitative measurements་ཀྱིས་རྩིས་ཐོག LJ-Speech་དང་LibriTTS ཡི་གྲངས་སྐོར་གྱི་Experimental Results་ནི་CUC-VAE TTS་ལག་གི་སྲོལ་རྒྱབ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་དང་སྒེར་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤ'}
{'en': 'Robust Lottery Tickets for Pre-trained Language Models', 'ar': 'المزج والمطابقة: توليد نص خالي من التعلم يمكن التحكم فيه باستخدام نماذج لغة الطاقة', 'pt': 'Misture e combine: geração de texto controlável sem aprendizado usando modelos de linguagem de energia', 'fr': "Mix and Match\xa0: Génération de texte contrôlable sans apprentissage à l'aide de modèles Energy Language", 'es': 'Combinar y combinar: generación de texto controlable sin aprendizaje mediante modelos de lenguaje energético', 'ja': 'Mix and Match ：学習フリーで制御可能なテキスト生成エネルギーを使用した言語モデル', 'zh': '混合搭配:免学可控文本生成用能量语模样', 'hi': 'मिक्स एंड मैच: सीखने से मुक्त नियंत्रणीय पाठ पीढ़ी का उपयोग कर ऊर्जा भाषा मॉडल', 'ru': 'Mix and Match: беспроблемная управляемая генерация текста с использованием моделей энергетического языка', 'ga': 'Meascadh agus Meaitseáil: Téacs Inrialaithe Gan Fhoghlaim Giniúint Úsáid Fuinnimh Múnlaí Teanga', 'el': 'Συνδυασμός και αντιστοίχιση: Χωρίς εκμάθηση ελεγχόμενη παραγωγή κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας ενεργειακά μοντέλα γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Mix and Match: Tanul찼s n챕lk체li, vez챕relhet흷 sz철veggener찼l찼sEnergianyelvi modellek seg챠ts챕g챕vel', 'ka': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Controlable Text Generationusing Energy Language Models', 'it': 'Mix and Match: Generazione di testo controllabile senza apprendimento utilizzando modelli di linguaggio energetico', 'lt': 'Mišinys ir derinys: be mokymosi kontroliuojamas teksto generavimasusing Energy Language Models', 'kk': 'Сәйкестігі аралас және сәйкестігі: Бос оқыту үшін мәтін құру энергия тіл үлгілері', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Controllable Text Generationusing Energy Language Models', 'mt': 'Taħlita u Taqsim: Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test Kontrollabbli mingħajr tagħlim li tuża Mudelli tal-Lingwa tal-Enerġija', 'mn': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Controlable Text Generation Energy Language Models', 'ml': 'പഠിക്കുന്നത്- സ്വതന്ത്രമായി നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പദാവലി സൃഷ്ടിക്കുക', 'no': 'Mix and Match: Læringsfri kontrollerbar tekst generering energiespråk- modeller', 'pl': 'Mix and Match: Bez nauki sterowane generowanie tekstu przy użyciu modeli języka energetycznego', 'ro': 'Mix and Match: Generare de text controlabilă fără învățare utilizând modele lingvistice energetice', 'sr': 'Mix and Match: Bez učenja kontrolni modeli energetske jezike', 'so': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Controllable Text Generation using Energy Models', 'sv': 'Mixa och matcha: Inlärningsfri kontrollerbar textgenerering med hjälp av energispråksmodeller', 'si': 'මික්ස් හා සැකසුම: පාලනය නිදහස් පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පාළුවන් පිළිබඳු පාළුවන් විදියට', 'ta': 'ஒன்றுசேர்', 'ur': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Controlable Text Generation Energy Language Models', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trộn và khớp: Hệ thống văn bản điều khiển tự do học dùng ngôn ngữ năng lượng', 'hr': 'Miješanje i odgovaranje: Modeli energetske jezike bez učenja', 'da': 'Mix and Match: Læringsfri styrbar tekstgenerering ved hjælp af energisprogsmodeller', 'bg': 'Микс и съвпадение: Безучено контролирано генериране на текст с помощта на енергийни езикови модели', 'nl': 'Mix and Match: Leervrij regelbare tekstgeneratie met behulp van energietaalmodellen', 'de': 'Mix and Match: Lernfrei steuerbare Texterzeugung mit Energiesprachemodellen', 'id': 'Mix and Match: Generasi Teks Terkontrol Bebas Belajar menggunakan Model Bahasa Energi', 'ko': '혼합과 일치: 에너지 언어 모델로 자유롭게 텍스트 생성 학습', 'fa': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Texts Generation Energy Language Models', 'tr': 'Karışma we Işleýşer: Öwrenmek ahyrsyz Metin Dopaslamak Enerji Dili Modeller', 'af': 'Menger en ooreenstemming: Leer- vry Kontrolbare Teks Genereer energietaal Modelle', 'sq': 'Përzjerje dhe përputhje: Gjenerimi i tekstit të kontrollueshëm pa mësim', 'am': 'Use Energy Language Models', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով էներգիայի լեզվի մոդելներ', 'az': 'KarńĪŇüma v…ô EŇüleŇüm…ô: √Ėyr…ônm…ôk √Ėyr…ôn…ô bil…ôn M…ôtn Yenilm…ôsi Enerji Dili Modell…ôri', 'bs': 'Miješanje i poklapanje: modeli energetske jezike bez učenja', 'bn': 'মিক্স এবং মিথ্যা: শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে শক্তি ভাষা মোডেল শিক্ষা বিনামূল্য নিয়ন্ত্রণের লেখা বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'cs': 'Mix and Match: Bez učení řízené generování textu pomocí energetických jazykových modelů', 'et': 'Mix and Match: õppimata kontrollitav teksti generatsioon, kasutades energiakeele mudeleid', 'ca': 'Mistura i Coincidència: generació de text controlable sense aprendre', 'sw': 'Utengenezaji wa Lugha ya Energy', 'fi': 'Mix and Match: Oppimaton Ohjattava Tekstin Generationusing Energy Language Models', 'jv': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free', 'he': 'שילוב ומתאים: גנרציה טקסט שליטה ללא ללמוד', 'sk': 'Mešajte in ujemajte: brezučno nadzorovano generiranje besedila z uporabo energetskih jezikovnih modelov', 'ha': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Controllable Text Generationusing Energy Language Models', 'bo': 'Mix and Match: Learning-free Controlable Text Generation Energy Language Models'}
{'en': 'Recent works on Lottery Ticket Hypothesis have shown that pre-trained language models (PLMs) contain smaller matching subnetworks(winning tickets) which are capable of reaching accuracy comparable to the original models. However, these tickets are proved to be notrobust to adversarial examples, and even worse than their PLM counterparts. To address this problem, we propose a novel method based on learning binary weight masks to identify robust tickets hidden in the original PLMs. Since the loss is not differentiable for the binary mask, we assign the hard concrete distribution to the masks and encourage their sparsity using a smoothing approximation of L0 regularization.Furthermore, we design an adversarial loss objective to guide the search for robust tickets and ensure that the tickets perform well bothin accuracy and robustness. Experimental results show the significant improvement of the proposed method over previous work on adversarial robustness evaluation.', 'ar': 'تطلب العمل الأخير في إنشاء النص الخاضع للرقابة إما ضبطًا دقيقًا على أساس السمات لنموذج اللغة الأساسية (LM) ، أو قام بتقييد تحديد معلمات مميّز السمة ليكون متوافقًا مع LM الأساسي الانحدار التلقائي. في هذا العمل ، نقترح Mix and Match LM ، وهو بديل عالمي قائم على النقاط لإنشاء نص يمكن التحكم فيه يجمع بين نماذج الصندوق الأسود التعسفية المدربة مسبقًا لتحقيق السمات المرغوبة في النص الذي تم إنشاؤه دون تضمين أي افتراضات صقل أو هيكلية حول نماذج الصندوق الأسود. نحن نفسر مهمة التوليد القابل للتحكم على أنه سحب عينات من نموذج قائم على الطاقة تكون قيم طاقته عبارة عن مزيج خطي من الدرجات من نماذج الصندوق الأسود المسؤولة بشكل منفصل عن الطلاقة وسمة التحكم والوفاء بأي سياق تكييف. نحن نستخدم مخطط أخذ العينات Metropolis-Hastings لأخذ عينات من هذا النموذج القائم على الطاقة باستخدام السياق ثنائي الاتجاه وميزات السمات العالمية. نحن نتحقق من فعالية نهجنا في العديد من مهام التوليد الخاضعة للرقابة ومراجعة النص المستندة إلى الأسلوب من خلال التفوق على الأساليب المقترحة مؤخرًا التي تتضمن تدريبًا إضافيًا أو ضبطًا دقيقًا أو افتراضات مقيدة على شكل النماذج.', 'es': 'El trabajo reciente sobre la generación de texto controlado ha requerido un ajuste fino basado en atributos del modelo de lenguaje base (LM) o ha restringido la parametrización del discriminador de atributos para que sea compatible con el LM autorregresivo base. En este trabajo, proponemos Mix and Match LM, una alternativa global basada en partituras para la generación de texto controlable que combina modelos arbitrarios de caja negra previamente entrenados para lograr los atributos deseados en el texto generado sin involucrar ningún ajuste o suposición estructural sobre los modelos de caja negra. Interpretamos la tarea de generación controlable como tomar muestras de un modelo basado en la energía cuyos valores de energía son una combinación lineal de puntuaciones de modelos de caja negra que son responsables por separado de la fluidez, el atributo de control y la fidelidad a cualquier contexto de condicionamiento. Utilizamos un esquema de muestreo de Metropolis-Hastings para tomar muestras de este modelo basado en la energía mediante el contexto bidireccional y las características de atributos globales. Validamos la eficacia de nuestro enfoque en varias tareas de revisión de texto basadas en estilos y generación controlada superando los métodos recientemente propuestos que implican capacitación adicional, ajustes o suposiciones restrictivas sobre la forma de los modelos.', 'fr': "Des travaux récents sur la génération contrôlée de texte ont soit exigé un réglage fin basé sur les attributs du modèle de langage de base (LM), soit ont restreint le paramétrage du discriminateur d'attribut pour qu'il soit compatible avec le LM autorégressif de base. Dans ce travail, nous proposons Mix and Match LM, une alternative globale basée sur les scores pour la génération de texte contrôlable qui combine des modèles de boîte noire préentraînés arbitraires pour obtenir les attributs souhaités dans le texte généré sans impliquer de réglage fin ou d'hypothèses structurelles sur les modèles de boîte noire. Nous interprétons la tâche de génération contrôlable comme le fait de prélever des échantillons à partir d'un modèle basé sur l'énergie dont les valeurs énergétiques sont une combinaison linéaire de scores provenant de modèles de boîte noire qui sont responsables séparément de la fluidité, de l'attribut de contrôle et de la fidélité à tout contexte de conditionnement. Nous utilisons un schéma d'échantillonnage Metropolis-Hastings pour échantillonner à partir de ce modèle basé sur l'énergie en utilisant un contexte bidirectionnel et des entités attributaires globales. Nous validons l'efficacité de notre approche sur diverses tâches de génération contrôlée et de révision de texte basées sur le style en surpassant les méthodes récemment proposées qui impliquent une formation supplémentaire, un ajustement précis ou des hypothèses restrictives par rapport à la forme de modèles.", 'pt': 'Trabalhos recentes sobre geração de texto controlado exigiram um ajuste fino baseado em atributo do modelo de linguagem base (LM), ou restringiu a parametrização do discriminador de atributo para ser compatível com o LM autorregressivo básico. Neste trabalho, propomos o Mix and Match LM, uma alternativa global baseada em pontuação para geração de texto controlável que combina modelos de caixa preta pré-treinados arbitrários para alcançar os atributos desejados no texto gerado sem envolver qualquer ajuste fino ou suposições estruturais sobre os modelos de caixa preta. Interpretamos a tarefa de geração controlável como extrair amostras de um modelo baseado em energia cujos valores de energia são uma combinação linear de pontuações de modelos caixa-preta que são separadamente responsáveis pela fluência, o atributo de controle e fidelidade a qualquer contexto de condicionamento. Usamos um esquema de amostragem Metropolis-Hastings para amostrar deste modelo baseado em energia usando contexto bidirecional e recursos de atributos globais. Validamos a eficácia de nossa abordagem em várias tarefas de revisão de texto baseadas em geração controlada e estilo, superando os métodos propostos recentemente que envolvem treinamento extra, ajuste fino ou suposições restritivas sobre a forma de modelos.', 'ja': '制御されたテキスト生成に関する最近の作業は、ベース言語モデル（ ＬＭ ）の属性ベースの微調整を必要とするか、またはベース自己回帰ＬＭと互換性があるように属性識別子のパラメータ化を制限している。 この研究では、制御可能なテキスト生成のためのグローバルなスコアベースの代替手段であるMix and Match LMを提案します。これは、ブラックボックスモデルに関する微調整や構造的仮定を伴うことなく、生成されたテキスト内の所望の属性を達成するための任意の事前にトレーニングされたブラックボックスモデルを組み合わせます。 私たちは、制御可能な生成のタスクを、エネルギー値が流動性、制御属性、および任意のコンディショニングコンテキストへの忠実度に個別に責任を負うブラックボックスモデルからのスコアの線形組み合わせであるエネルギーベースのモデルからサンプルを引き出すと解釈します。 当社は、双方向のコンテキストとグローバル属性機能を使用して、このエネルギーベースのモデルからサンプリングするためにMetropolis - Hastingsサンプリングスキームを使用しています。 私たちは、さまざまな制御された生成およびスタイルベースのテキストリビジョンタスクに対する私たちのアプローチの有効性を検証します。これは、モデルの形式を超えた追加のトレーニング、微調整、または制限的な仮定を伴う最近提案された方法よりも優れています。', 'zh': '近者受控文本生事,或质言语 (LM) 本乎性调,或限性鉴别器之参数化,使与本归 LM 兼容。 凡此诸事,Mix and Match LM有Mix MatM,此乃分数之可控,全局代方,合随意训练之黑盒,以成文本之性,无涉于黑盒之微构。 说可控以为样本,合之以黑盒线性,黑盒之以流利,制之于上下文。 吾用 Metropolis-Hastings 采样方,用双向上下文全局,自此基于量采样。 优于近出之法,验于百受控之成,刊定其有效性,涉对模型额外训练,微调限制性设。', 'hi': 'नियंत्रित पाठ पीढ़ी पर हाल के काम को या तो आधार भाषा मॉडल (LM) की विशेषता-आधारित ठीक-ट्यूनिंग की आवश्यकता होती है, या आधार autoregressive LM के साथ संगत होने के लिए विशेषता भेदभावपूर्ण के पैरामीटराइजेशन को प्रतिबंधित कर दिया है। इस काम में, हम मिक्स एंड मैच एलएम का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो नियंत्रणीय पाठ पीढ़ी के लिए एक वैश्विक स्कोर-आधारित विकल्प है जो ब्लैक-बॉक्स मॉडल के बारे में किसी भी ठीक-ट्यूनिंग या संरचनात्मक मान्यताओं को शामिल किए बिना उत्पन्न पाठ में वांछित विशेषताओं को प्राप्त करने के लिए मनमाने ढंग से पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ब्लैक-बॉक्स मॉडल को जोड़ता है। हम एक ऊर्जा-आधारित मॉडल से नमूने खींचने के रूप में नियंत्रणीय पीढ़ी के कार्य की व्याख्या करते हैं, जिनके ऊर्जा मूल्य ब्लैक-बॉक्स मॉडल से स्कोर का एक रैखिक संयोजन हैं जो किसी भी कंडीशनिंग संदर्भ के प्रवाह, नियंत्रण विशेषता और वफादारी के लिए अलग से जिम्मेदार हैं। हम द्विदिश संदर्भ और वैश्विक विशेषता सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके इस ऊर्जा-आधारित मॉडल से नमूना लेने के लिए एक मेट्रोपोलिस-हेस्टिंग्स नमूना योजना का उपयोग करते हैं। हम विभिन्न नियंत्रित पीढ़ी और शैली-आधारित पाठ संशोधन कार्यों पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता को हाल ही में प्रस्तावित तरीकों से बाहर करके मान्य करते हैं जिसमें मॉडल के रूप में अतिरिक्त प्रशिक्षण, ठीक-ट्यूनिंग, या प्रतिबंधात्मक धारणाएं शामिल हैं।', 'ru': 'Недавние работы по созданию контролируемого текста либо потребовали тонкой настройки базовой языковой модели (LM) на основе атрибутов, либо ограничили параметризацию дискриминанта атрибутов, чтобы быть совместимым с базовым авторегрессивным LM. В этой работе мы предлагаем Mix and Match LM, глобальную оценочную альтернативу для управляемой генерации текста, которая сочетает в себе произвольные предварительно обученные модели черного ящика для достижения желаемых атрибутов в сгенерированном тексте без каких-либо точных настроек или структурных предположений о моделях черного ящика. Мы интерпретируем задачу управляемой генерации как выборку из энергоориентированной модели, энергетические значения которой представляют собой линейную комбинацию баллов из моделей черного ящика, которые отдельно отвечают за беглость, управляющий атрибут и точность в любом контексте кондиционирования. Мы используем схему выборки Метрополис-Гастингс для выборки из этой энергетической модели с использованием двунаправленного контекста и глобальных признаков атрибутов. Мы подтверждаем эффективность нашего подхода к различным контролируемым задачам генерации и редактирования текста на основе стиля, превосходя недавно предложенные методы, которые включают дополнительное обучение, точную настройку или ограничительные допущения над формой моделей.', 'ga': "D'éiligh obair a rinneadh le déanaí ar ghiniúint téacs rialaithe mionchoigeartú bunaithe ar shaintréithe ar an múnla bonnteanga (LM), nó chuir sé srian le paraiméadarú an idirdhealaitheoir tréithe chun a bheith ag luí leis an LM uathchéimnitheach bonn. Sa saothar seo, molaimid Mix and Match LM, rogha dhomhanda scórbhunaithe do ghiniúint téacs inrialaithe a chomhcheanglaíonn samhlacha treallacha réamh-oilte an bhosca dhubh chun na tréithe inmhianaithe sa téacs ginte a bhaint amach gan aon mhionchoigeartú nó boinn tuisceana struchtúracha a bheith i gceist leis. na samhlacha bosca dubh. Léirmhínímid tasc na giniúna inrialaithe mar shamplaí a tharraingt ó mhúnla atá bunaithe ar fhuinneamh a bhfuil a luachanna fuinnimh ina meascán líneach de scóir ó mhúnlaí bosca dubh atá freagrach go leithleach as líofacht, an tréith rialaithe, agus dílseacht d'aon chomhthéacs riochtaithe. Bainimid úsáid as scéim samplála Metropolis-Hastings chun sampláil a dhéanamh ón tsamhail seo atá bunaithe ar fhuinneamh ag baint úsáide as comhthéacs déthreoch agus tréithe domhanda. Déanaimid bailíochtú ar éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige ar thascanna éagsúla um ghiniúint rialaithe agus athbhreithnithe téacs stíl-bhunaithe trí bheith níos fearr ná na modhanna a moladh le déanaí lena mbaineann oiliúint bhreise, mionchoigeartú, nó boinn tuisceana sriantacha ar fhoirmeacha samhlacha.", 'ka': 'მხოლოდ კონტროლირებული ტექსტის შექმნაზე მუშაობა ან ატრიბუტის დაბათი ენის მოდელის (LM) კონტროლირებულია, ან ატრიბუტის დისკრიმინატორის პარამეტრიზაციას დასაჭირდება, რომ ბაზის ავტორეგრესი ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მუშაობით Mix და Match LM-ს, გლობალური წერტილების დაბაზეული ალტენტიფიკატი ტექსტის შექმნისთვის, რომელიც კონტროლური ტექსტის შექმნისთვის, რომელიც აბრიტრალური წერტილებული შავ-ბოსტის მოდელების შესაძლებელად და ჩვენ კონტროლური წარმოდგენის დავარყვებთ როგორც ენერგიის მოდელიდან მონაცემები, რომელიც ენერგიის მნიშვნელობები არის შავ-კოსტის მოდელიდან ლინერგიური კომბიუნიაცია, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულია ფუნქციის, კო ჩვენ Metropolis-Hastings სქემის გამოყენება ამ ენერგიის მოდელიდან გამოყენებული ორიეთრექციური კონტექსტის და გლობალური ატრიბუტის ფუნქციების გამოყენება. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობას განსხვავებული კონტროლური წარმოდგენის და სტილური ტექსტის რევისუციის დავაკეთებული საქმედებისთვის, რომლებიც მოდელების ფორმის შესახებ გავაკეთებთ ახალ', 'hu': 'Az ellenőrzött szöveggenerálással kapcsolatos közelmúltbeli munkák vagy az alapnyelv (LM) attribútumalapú finomhangolását követelték meg, vagy korlátozták az attribútumdiszkriminátor paraméterezését, hogy kompatibilis legyen az alapnyelv autoregresszív LM-vel. Ebben a munkában javasoljuk a Mix and Match LM-et, amely egy globális pontszámon alapuló alternatíva a vezérelhető szöveggeneráláshoz, amely tetszőleges előre képzett fekete doboz modelleket kombinál a kívánt attribútumok eléréséhez a generált szövegben anélkül, hogy finomhangolást vagy strukturális feltételezést igényelne a fekete doboz modellekre vonatkozóan. Az irányítható generálás feladatát úgy értelmezzük, mintha mintákat rajzolnánk egy energia alapú modellből, amelynek energiaértékei a fekete dobozos modellekből származó pontszámok lineáris kombinációja, amelyek külön felelősek a folyékonyságért, a vezérlő attribútumért és a kondicionáló kontextushoz való hűségért. Metropolis-Hastings mintavételi rendszert használunk ebből az energialapú modellből kétirányú kontextusból és globális attribútumokból. Megközelítésünk hatékonyságát a különböző kontrollált generációs és stílusalapú szövegfelülvizsgálati feladatokban érvényesítjük azáltal, hogy túllépjük a közelmúltban javasolt módszereket, amelyek extra képzést, finomhangolást vagy korlátozó feltételezéseket foglalnak magukban a modellek formájában.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εργασίες σχετικά με την ελεγχόμενη παραγωγή κειμένου έχουν είτε απαιτήσει την τελειοποίηση του μοντέλου γλώσσας βάσης με βάση τα χαρακτηριστικά, είτε έχουν περιορίσει την παραμετροποίηση του διαχωριστή χαρακτηριστικών ώστε να είναι συμβατή με την αυτόματη αναδρομική βάση βάσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια παγκόσμια εναλλακτική λύση για την ελεγχόμενη παραγωγή κειμένου που συνδυάζει αυθαίρετα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα μαύρων κουτιών για την επίτευξη των επιθυμητών χαρακτηριστικών στο παραγόμενο κείμενο χωρίς να εμπλέκονται τυχόν λεπτομερείς ρυθμίσεις ή δομικές παραδοχές σχετικά με τα μοντέλα μαύρων κουτιών. Ερμηνεύουμε το έργο της ελεγχόμενης παραγωγής ως λήψη δειγμάτων από ένα ενεργειακό μοντέλο του οποίου οι ενεργειακές τιμές είναι ένας γραμμικός συνδυασμός βαθμολογιών από μοντέλα μαύρων κουτιών που είναι ξεχωριστά υπεύθυνα για την ρευστότητα, το χαρακτηριστικό ελέγχου και την πιστότητα σε οποιοδήποτε πλαίσιο προσαρμογής. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα σύστημα δειγματοληψίας Μητρόπολης-Χέιστινγκς για να δειγματοληψίσουμε από αυτό το ενεργειακό μοντέλο χρησιμοποιώντας αμφίδρομο πλαίσιο και παγκόσμια χαρακτηριστικά χαρακτηριστικών. Επιβεβαιώνουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας σε διάφορες εργασίες αναθεώρησης κειμένου ελεγχόμενης γενιάς και στυλ, ξεπερνώντας τις πρόσφατες προτεινόμενες μεθόδους που περιλαμβάνουν επιπλέον εκπαίδευση, τελειοποίηση ή περιοριστικές υποθέσεις σχετικά με τη μορφή μοντέλων.', 'it': "Il recente lavoro sulla generazione di testo controllato ha richiesto la messa a punto del modello di lingua di base (LM) basata sugli attributi, oppure ha limitato la parametrizzazione del discriminatore di attributo per essere compatibile con LM autoregressivo di base. In questo lavoro, proponiamo Mix and Match LM, un'alternativa globale basata su punteggi per la generazione di testo controllabile che combina modelli di black-box arbitrari pre-addestrati per ottenere gli attributi desiderati nel testo generato senza implicare alcuna messa a punto o ipotesi strutturali sui modelli black-box. Interpretiamo il compito della generazione controllabile come il prelievo di campioni da un modello basato sull'energia i cui valori energetici sono una combinazione lineare di punteggi da modelli black-box che sono separatamente responsabili della fluidità, dell'attributo di controllo e della fedeltà a qualsiasi contesto condizionante. Utilizziamo uno schema di campionamento Metropolis-Hastings per campionare da questo modello basato sull'energia utilizzando contesto bidirezionale e caratteristiche di attributi globali. Convalidiamo l'efficacia del nostro approccio su vari compiti di generazione controllata e revisione del testo basati sullo stile superando i metodi recentemente proposti che comportano formazione supplementare, messa a punto o ipotesi restrittive sulla forma dei modelli.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы контроллеу мәтін құрылғысындағы жұмыс қажетті атрибуттарға негізгі тіл үлгісін (LM) баптау немесе атрибутты дискриминатордың параметрлерін негізгі авторегресивті LM- мен үйлесімді болу үшін шектеп берді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, LM- тің Mix және Сәйкестігін қолдануға мүмкіндік беретін мәтін құру үшін жалпы сәйкестіктер негіздеген альтернативті қолданамыз. Бұл құрылған мәтіндегі атрибуттарды жеткізу үшін қара жазу үлгілерін біріктіреді. Біз энергиясы негіздеген үлгіден бақылайтын құрылғының тапсырмаларын түсіндіреміз. Оның энергиясы қара жазулар үлгілерінен, бөлек бөлек бөлек бөлек қара жазулар үлгілерінен, басқару атрибуттарынан, әрбір шарттарын Біз Metropolis-Hastings баптау сұлбасын энергиясы негіздеген үлгілерден қолданамыз. Бұл үлгілерді екі директив контексті мен жалпы атрибуттар мүмкіндігін қолдану үшін. Біз әртүрлі бақылау және стиліндегі мәтін редакциялау тапсырмаларының әсерін тексереміз. Жуырдағы тапсырмаларды қосымша оқыту, бақылау және үлгілер пішіміне шектеу арқылы қосымша оқыту,', 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikus kontroliuojamo teksto kūrimo darbą buvo reikalingas pagrindinio kalbos modelio (LM) patikslinimas pagal požymius arba apribotas požymių diskriminatoriaus parametrizavimas, kad jis būtų suderinamas su baziniu autoregresuojančiu LM. Šiame darbe siūlome Mix and Match LM, pasaulinę rezultatais pagrįstą alternatyvą kontroliuojamai teksto kūrimui, kurioje derinami savavališki iš anksto parengti juodos dėžutės modeliai norimiems požymiams pasiekti sukurtame tekste, neįtraukiant jokių tikslių ar struktūrinių prielaidų dėl juodos dėžutės modelių. Mes suprantame kontroliuojamos gamybos užduotį kaip ėminių ėmimą iš energetiniu modeliu, kurio energijos vertės yra linijinis taškų derinys iš juodos dėžutės modelių, kurie yra atskirai atsakingi už skystumą, kontrolinį požymią ir patikimumą bet kokiam kondicionavimo kontekstui. Mes naudojame Metropolis-Hastings mėginių ėmimo sistemą, kad mėginiai būtų paimti iš šio energetiniu modelio, naudojant dvikryptį kontekstą ir pasaulinius požymius. Patvirtiname mūsų požiūrio į įvairias kontroliuojamas kartas ir stiliu grindžiamas teksto peržiūros užduotis veiksmingumą, nes neseniai pasiūlyti metodai, apimantys papildomą mokymą, patobulinimą arba ribojančias prielaidas modelių forma.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешната работа на контролираната генерација на текст или бара финетизирање на основниот јазик модел (LM) базиран на атрибутите, или ја ограничи параметризацијата на дискриминаторот на атрибутите за да биде компатибилна со основната авторегресивна LM. Во оваа работа, предложуваме Микс и Компиш ЛМ, глобална алтернатива базирана на резултати за контролирана генерација на текст која комбинира арбитрални предобучени црни кутии модели за постигнување на желбите атрибути во генерираниот текст без да вклучува никакви фино-прилагодувања или структурни претпост Ја интерпретираме задачата на контролираната генерација како примероци од енергетски модел чии енергетски вредности се линијарна комбинација на оценки од црни модели кои се одделно одговорни за течноста, контролниот атрибут и верноста во било кој кондиционален контекст. Ние користиме шема на примероци од Метрополис-Хејстингс за примероци од овој енергетски модел користејќи двојно контекст и глобални атрибути карактеристики. Ја потврдуваме ефикасноста на нашиот пристап во различните контролирани генерации и стилови ревизиски задачи со текст преку извршување на неодамна предложените методи кои вклучуваат дополнителна обука, финетизирање или рестриктивни претпоставувања во врска со формата на', 'ml': 'അടുത്തിടെ നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഗുണഭാഷ മോഡലിന്റെ (LM) അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നല്ല ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, മിക്സും മാച്ച് എംഎം, നിയന്ത്രിക്കാവുന്ന വാചകത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d തലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള മറ്റൊരു ഐച്ഛികമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന് നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന തലമുറകളുടെ ജോലി ഒരു ഊര്\u200dജ്ജി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നും മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d വരയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഊര്\u200dജ്ജ മൂല്ല്യങ്ങള We use a Metropolis-Hastings sampling scheme to sample from this energy-based model using bidirectional context and global attribute features.  നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട തലമുറകളിലും രീതിയിലുമുള്ള ടെക്സ്റ്റ് റിപ്പോര്\u200dഷന്\u200d ജോലികളിലും നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തികമാണ് നമ്മുടെ പ്', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үеийн хэрэглэгдсэн текст төрөлхтний ажил нь суурь хэл загварын (LM) харилцааны төвөгтэй харилцааны шаардлагатай, эсвэл харилцааны шийдвэрлэгчийн параметрийг суурь автоregressive LM-тэй холбоотой болгохыг хязгаарладаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид "Mix and Match LM"-г дэлхийн тооны үндсэн өөрчлөлт, хар-хайрцаг загварын талаар ямар ч сайн тодорхойлолт эсвэл бүтцийн тодорхойлолтоор бий болгох хүсэлтэй хар-хайрцаг загваруудыг нийлүүлдэг. Бид эрчим хүчний үндсэн загвараас удирдлагатай үеийн даалгаварыг энергийн загвараас зурж, энергийн утга нь хар хайрцаг загвараас ялгаатай хар хайрцаг загвараас харьцангуй загвараас харьцангуй хариуцлага, удирдлагын хариуцлага, үнэнч байдал,  Бид метрополис-Хейстингс шалгалтын төлөвлөгөө ашиглаж энергийн загвараас хоёр давхар үйл явдал болон дэлхийн харилцааны төлөвлөгөөг ашиглаж байна. Бид саяхан дасгал суралцах, дасгал хөгжүүлэх, эсвэл загварын хэлбэрээр хязгаарлагдмал тодорхойлолтуудын үр дүнг баталдаг.', 'ms': 'Kerja baru-baru ini pada generasi teks terkawal sama ada memerlukan penyesuaian baik berdasarkan atribut bagi model bahasa asas (LM), atau telah mencatat parameterisasi diskriminator atribut untuk kompatibel dengan LM asas autoregressif. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan Mix and Match LM, alternatif global berdasarkan skor untuk generasi teks yang boleh dikawal yang menggabungkan model kotak hitam terlatih secara arbitrari untuk mencapai atribut yang diinginkan dalam teks yang dijana tanpa melibatkan mana-mana penyesuaian baik atau asumsi struktur mengenai model kotak hitam. Kami menerangkan tugas generasi yang boleh dikawal sebagai melukis sampel dari model berdasarkan tenaga yang nilai tenaga adalah kombinasi linear skor dari model kotak hitam yang bertanggungjawab secara terpisah untuk keseluruhan, atribut kawalan, dan kesetiaan kepada mana-mana konteks pengkondisi. Kami menggunakan skema pengumpulan Metropolis-Hastings untuk sampel dari model berdasarkan tenaga ini menggunakan konteks bidireksi dan ciri-ciri atribut global. Kita sahkan kegunaan pendekatan kita pada pelbagai kerja gerasi terkawal dan tugas revisi teks berdasarkan gaya dengan melaksanakan kaedah yang diusulkan baru-baru ini yang melibatkan latihan tambahan, penyesuaian baik, atau asumsi terhad atas bentuk model.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie prace nad kontrolowanym generowaniem tekstu wymagały albo dopracowania opartego na atrybutach modelu języka bazowego (LM), albo ograniczyły parametryzację dyskryminatora atrybutów, aby był kompatybilny z bazowym autoregresywnym LM. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy Mix and Match LM, globalną alternatywę dla sterowanego generowania tekstu opartą na wynikach, która łączy dowolne wstępnie przeszkolone modele czarnej skrzynki w celu osiągnięcia pożądanych atrybutów w generowanym tekście bez uwzględniania jakichkolwiek precyzyjnych lub założeń strukturalnych dotyczących modeli czarnej skrzynki. Zadanie sterowanego generowania interpretujemy jako pobieranie próbek z modelu opartego na energii, którego wartości energetyczne stanowią liniową kombinację punktów z modeli czarnej skrzynki, które oddzielnie odpowiadają za płynność, atrybut sterowania i wierność każdemu kontekstowi warunkowania. Używamy schematu próbkowania Metropolis-Hastings do próbkowania z tego modelu opartego na energii przy użyciu dwukierunkowego kontekstu i globalnych cech atrybutów. Weryfikujemy skuteczność naszego podejścia do różnych zadań kontrolowanego generowania i modyfikacji tekstu opartych na stylu poprzez przewyższanie ostatnio proponowanych metod, które obejmują dodatkowe szkolenia, dostosowanie lub restrykcyjne założenia w stosunku do formy modeli.', 'no': 'Nyleg arbeid på kontrollerte tekstgenerering har anten nødvendig attributbasert finnstilling av grunnspråk- modellen (LM), eller har avgrensa parameteriseringa av attributtdiskrimineratoren som er kompatibel med grunnregressivt LM. I denne arbeida foreslår vi miks og passar med LM, eit globalt innstilling for kontrollbare tekstgenerering som kombinerer tilfeldig føretrainerte svarboks- modeller for å oppnå dei ønskte attributtane i den genererte teksten utan å involvera noen finnstillingar eller strukturelle antar om svarboks- modeller. Vi tolkar oppgåva til kontrollerbare generasjon som teikn prøver frå eit energiebasert modell som energieverdiane er ein lineær kombinasjon av poeng frå svartboksmodeller som er separe ansvarleg for flukte, kontrollerattributtet og tiltrukkelse til alle kondicioningskontekstane. Vi bruker eit prøveskjema for Metropolis-Hastings for å prøve ut frå denne energiebaserte modellen med bidireksjonal kontekst og globale attributtfunksjonar. Vi validerer effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt på ulike kontrollerte generasjon og stilbaserte tekstrevisjonsbaserte oppgåver ved å utføra nyleg foreslått metoder som involverer ekstra trening, fintuning eller restriksjon over formen av modeller.', 'ro': 'Lucrările recente privind generarea controlată de text au necesitat fie reglarea fină bazată pe atribute a modelului de limbă de bază (LM), fie a restricționat parametrizarea discriminatorului de atribute pentru a fi compatibil cu LM autoregresiv de bază. În această lucrare, propunem Mix and Match LM, o alternativă globală bazată pe scoruri pentru generarea de text controlabil, care combină modele arbitrare pre-instruite de cutie neagră pentru obținerea atributelor dorite în textul generat fără a implica nicio reglare fină sau ipoteză structurală despre modelele de cutie neagră. Interpretăm sarcina generării controlabile ca desenând mostre dintr-un model bazat pe energie ale cărui valori energetice sunt o combinație liniară de scoruri din modele de cutie neagră care sunt responsabile separat de fluență, atributul de control și fidelitatea față de orice context de condiționare. Utilizăm o schemă de eșantionare Metropolis-Hastings pentru a eșantiona din acest model bazat pe energie folosind contextul bidirecțional și caracteristicile atributelor globale. Validăm eficacitatea abordării noastre asupra diverselor sarcini de revizuire a textului controlate și de generare bazate pe stil, depășind metodele propuse recent, care implică instruire suplimentară, reglare fină sau ipoteze restrictive asupra formei modelelor.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණය කළ පාළුව නිර්මාණයේ අතින්ම වැඩේ අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් හැකියාවක් අධාරිත භාෂා මොඩේලය (LM) ගැන හැකියාවක් හැකියාවක් නැත මේ වැඩේදී, අපි මික්ස් හා මැක්ස් LM විශේෂය කරනවා, පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පාළුවන් විශේෂණය සඳහා ජාතික ස්කෝර් ස්ථාපිත විකල්පයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් පෙළ අපි පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණයේ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපි අපි මෙට්\u200dරොපොලිස්-හේස්ටින්ස්ග් සැම්ප්ලින්ස් ස්කම්ප්ලිම් එකක් භාවිත කරනවා මේ ශක්තිය අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විදියට අපි විවිධ පාලනය සහ විවිධ පිළිබඳ පරීක්ෂණය සහ විවිධ පාළිබඳ පරීක්ෂණ ක්\u200dරියාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ගැන පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අ', 'mt': 'Xogħol reċenti dwar il-ġenerazzjoni tat-test ikkontrollat jew jeħtieġ aġġustament fin ibbażat fuq l-attributi tal-mudell tal-lingwa bażi (LM), jew irristrinġi l-parametrizzazzjoni tad-diskriminatur tal-attribut biex ikun kompatibbli mal-LM awtoregressiv bażi. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu Mix and Match LM, alternattiva globali bbażata fuq il-punteġġi għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ test kontrollabbli li tgħaqqad mudelli arbitrarji ta’ kaxxa sewda mħarrġa minn qabel biex jinkisbu l-attributi mixtieqa fit-test ġenerat mingħajr ma tinvolvi kwalunkwe suppożizzjoni fina jew strutturali dwar il-mudelli tal-kaxxa sewda. Aħna ninterpretaw il-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni kontrollabbli bħala teħid ta’ kampjuni minn mudell ibbażat fuq l-enerġija li l-valuri tal-enerġija tiegħu huma kombinazzjoni lineari ta’ punteġġi minn mudelli tal-kaxxa sewda li huma responsabbli separatament għall-fluwenza, l-attribut tal-kontroll, u l-fiduċja għal kwalunkwe kuntest kondizzjonat. We use a Metropolis-Hastings sampling scheme to sample from this energy-based model using bidirectional context and global attribute features.  Aħna nivvalidaw l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna fuq diversi kompiti ta’ ġenerazzjoni kkontrollata u reviżjoni tat-test ibbażati fuq l-istil billi nippreżentaw metodi proposti reċentement li jinvolvu taħriġ addizzjonali, aġġustament finat, jew suppożizzjonijiet restrittivi fuq il-forma ta’ mudelli.', 'so': 'Shaqo ku saabsan abuurista qoraalka la maamulay wuxuu ku baahan yahay tusaale afka aasiga ah (LM), ama wuxuu ku xaday qaabilaadda takoorista takoorka takoorka, si loo baroorto LM hoose u eg. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa Mix iyo Match LM, qaab caalami ah oo u bedela qoraal dhasha maamulka la maamulayo, kaas oo ku soo ururiya modelalka la arbitrary-trained hore madow-box, si aan u gaadhno faa’iidada la jecel yahay in laga helo qoraalka la sameeyo iyadoo aan ku jirin malooyin qurxoon ama qaab structuri ah oo ku saabsan modellada madow-box. Shaqooyinka qarniga maamulka ah sida dhaqdhaqaalaha samooyin ka soo sawiraya samooyin asalka energiga, qiimaheeda energiyadu waa isku xiran sawirada midowga madowga oo gooni ahaanba ka mas’uul yahay sawirka, tayada kontrollka iyo aaminnimada xaaladaha oo dhan. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qorshaha sameynta ee Metropolis-Hastings si aan uga sameynno tilmaamahan energiga ee ku saleysan isticmaalka qalabka midibka iyo tababarka caalamka ah. Waxaynu xaqiijinnaa awoodda dhaqdhaheenna oo ku saabsan shaqaalaha la ilaaliyo farshaxan kala duduwan iyo qoraal cusboonaysiinta oo ku qoran qaababka loo soo jeeday ee ku saabsan waxbarasho dheeraad ah, tababar wanaagsan, ama malaha xadgudba qaabka modelalka.', 'sv': 'Det senaste arbetet med kontrollerad textgenerering har antingen krävt attributbaserad finjustering av basspråksmodellen (LM), eller har begränsat parameteriseringen av attributdiskrimineraren till att vara kompatibel med basregressiv LM. I detta arbete föreslår vi Mix and Match LM, ett globalt poängbaserat alternativ för kontrollerbar textgenerering som kombinerar godtyckliga förintränade svarta rutemodeller för att uppnå önskade attribut i den genererade texten utan att involvera några finjusteringar eller strukturella antaganden om svarta rutemodellerna. Vi tolkar uppgiften med kontrollerbar generering som att ta prover från en energibaserad modell vars energivärden är en linjär kombination av poäng från svartboxmodeller som är separat ansvariga för flytande, kontrollattribut och trofasthet till alla konditioneringskontexter. Vi använder ett Metropolis-Hastings provtagningsschema för att testa från denna energibaserade modell med tvåriktad kontext och globala attributfunktioner. Vi validerar effektiviteten i vårt tillvägagångssätt på olika kontrollerade generations- och stilbaserade textrevideringsuppgifter genom att överträffa nyligen föreslagna metoder som innebär extra utbildning, finjustering eller restriktiva antaganden i form av modeller.', 'ur': 'ان سے اچھا کام ہے جو کنٹرول ٹیکسٹ نسل پر ہے یا بنسٹ زبان موڈل (LM) کی آبریٹ-بنسٹ کی پاکیزگی تنظیم کرنے کی ضرورت رکھتی ہے، یا آبریٹ جدائی کرنے والے کی پارامتریزی کو بنسٹ autoregressive LM کے ساتھ ملنے کے لئے محدود کردیا ہے. ہم اس کام میں مکس اور مکس LM کی پیشنهاد کریں گے، ایک گلوبی اسکور بنیاد رکھنے والی متکس پیدائش کے لئے جو سیاه باکس موڈل کے بارے میں کسی طرح طرح طرح طرح سے پیش آموزش کی سیاه باکس موڈل کو ترکیب کرتا ہے جو پیدا کئے گئے متکس میں خواہشوں کی آئیٹیوں کو پہنچانے کے لئے بغیر کسی طرح طرح طرح ہم کنٹرول قابل نسل کے کام کو ایک انرژی بنیادی موڈل سے نمونے بناتے ہیں جن کے انرژی مقدار سیاه باکس موڈل سے سیاه باکس کے نمونے سے سیاه ترکیب ہیں جن کے لئے الگ الگ الگ مسئولیت ہے، کنٹرول آبریٹ اور ہر کنڈیسینگ کنٹیسینگ کے ساتھ اعتبار ہے ہم نے ایک متروپولیس-ہیستینگ نمونگ طریقہ استعمال کرتا ہے کہ اس انرژی پر بنیاد ہوئی موڈل سے نمونہ بنائیں، دوئرٹریک کنٹیکسٹ اور گلوبل آبریٹ ویٹیوں کے استعمال سے۔ ہم نے مختلف کنٹرول کی نسل اور استیلیں بنیاد لکھی تغییر کے کاموں پر اپنے طریقے کا اقتدار ثابت قدم رکھا ہے، جو اضافہ تغییر، مضبوط تغییر، یا مدل کے فرم پر محدودیت کرنے والی فرض کے ذریعہ سے اضافہ کرتی ہیں.', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட உரை உருவாக்கத்தின் சமீபத்தில் செயல் அடிப்படை மொழி மாதிரியின் குணங்களின் குணங்களை அடிப்படையில் சார்ந்து மாற்றும் பொருத்தமான In this work, we propose Mix and Match LM, a global score-based alternative for controllable text generation that combines arbitrary pre-trained black-box models for achieving the desired attributes in the generated text without involving any fine-tuning or structural assumptions about the black-box models.  நாம் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்படும் தலைமுறையின் செயலை மாதிரிகளை வரைதலாம் ஒரு சக்தி அடிப்படையில் இருந்து வரைதலாம். அதன் சக்தி மதிப்புகள் கருப்பெட்டி மாதிரிகளிலிருந்து ஒரு வரிசை மெட்ரோபோலிஸ்- ஹாஸ்டிங்ஸ் மாதிரி முறைமை நாங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் வெவ்வேறு கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட தலைமுறையில் மற்றும் பாணியிலான உரை மீட்டும் பணிகளை செயல்படுத்தி அண்மையில் செயல்படுத்தும்', 'sr': 'Nedavni rad na kontroliranoj generaciji teksta ili je potrebno ispravno navođenje na atributu baziranog jezičkog modela (LM), ili je ograničio parameterizaciju diskriminacije atributa da bude kompatibilna sa bazom autoregresivnog LM. U ovom poslu predlažemo alternativu miksa i mešavanja LM-a, koja je bazirana na globalnim rezultatima za kontroliranu generaciju teksta koja kombinuje arbitrarne pre-obučene crne kutije modele za ostvarivanje željenih atributa u proizvedenom tekstu bez uključenja bilo kakvih finalnih ili strukturnih pretpostavki o modelima crne kutije. Mi interpretiramo zadatak kontrolabilne generacije kao uzorke iz model a na energiji čije energetske vrijednosti su linearna kombinacija rezultata iz modela crne kutije koji su odvojeno odgovorni za tekućinu, kontrolnu atributu i vernost svakom kontekstu za uvjetnost. Koristimo metropolis-Hastings šemu uzoraka iz ovog model a na energiji koristeći bisdirektivni kontekst i globalne karakteristike atributa. Potvrđujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa na različitim zadacima za reviziju teksta na kontroliranoj generaciji i stilu, izvršavajući nedavno predložene metode koje uključuju dodatne obuke, finaliziranje ili ograničavajuće pretpostavke o obliku modela.', 'uz': "Boshqaruvchi matn taʼminlovchisi asosiy til modeli (LM) boʻyicha boʻlishi kerak boʻladi yoki asosiy avto- boshqaruvchi LM bilan bogʻliq boʻlganligini moslash moslamalarini chegara qiladi. Bu ishda biz Mix va Match LM, boshqaruvchi matn generalida boshqaruv boshqaruvchisi, bir avtomatik o'rganilgan qora qutis modellarini birlashtirish uchun yaratilgan matnning moslamalarini ishga tushirish uchun qo'llangan matnning xossalarini yordamida qo'llanmalar yoki structural foydalanishni qoʻllash mumkin. Biz tasavvur boshqaruvchi avvalning vazifasini energiya asosida misollarni chiqarish mumkin, uning energiya qiymati qiymatlarining qiymati qora qutis modellaridan qiymatlarini birlashtirish mumkin. Ular suhbat, boshqaruv xossalari, va hamma holatning muhimligga ishonchining faqat. Biz Metropolis-Hastings sampli qolipdan foydalanamiz, bu energiya asosidagi modeldan foydalanuvchi qismi va global moslamalar imkoniyatlaridan foydalanish uchun. We validate the effectiveness of our approach on various controlled generation and style-based text revision tasks by outperforming recently proposed methods that involve extra training, fine-tuning, or restrictive assumptions over the form of models.", 'vi': 'Công việc gần đây của chế độ văn bản bị điều khiển có thể yêu cầu hiệu chỉnh độ chính của mô hình ngôn ngữ cơ bản (LM) hoặc đã giới hạn chế độ phân đo của người phân biệt tài năng để phù hợp với hệ thống LM tự động cơ bản. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị Mix và Match LM, một thay thế toàn cầu dựa vào điểm để cấu tạo văn bản điều khiển được điều khiển, nó kết hợp các mô hình đen được rèn luyện ngẫu nhiên để đạt được các thuộc tính cần thiết trong văn bản đã tạo ra mà không cần phải giả thiết về các mô hình hộp đen. Chúng tôi coi nhiệm vụ sản xuất điều khiển có thể điều khiển như là mẫu vẽ từ một mô hình dựa trên năng lượng, giá trị năng lượng là một sự kết hợp đường thẳng giữa điểm với các mô hình hộp đen, chịu trách nhiệm về vận động, tính năng điều khiển, và độ trung thành với bất kỳ trường hợp điều hòa nào. Chúng tôi dùng một kế hoạch lấy mẫu từ mô hình dựa trên năng lượng này, sử dụng ngữ cảnh sinh lý và tính năng thuộc tính to àn cầu. Chúng tôi xác nhận hiệu quả cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi về các công việc thay đổi văn bản theo kiểu và sản xuất khác nhau bằng cách vượt qua các phương pháp được đề xuất gần đây, gồm việc đào tạo thêm, cải tạo hay các giả thuyết hạn chế trên dạng mô hình.', 'hr': 'Nedavni rad na kontroliranoj generaciji teksta ili je potrebno ispravno prilagođenje baznog jezičkog modela (LM) na atributu, ili je ograničio parameterizaciju diskriminacije atributa da bude kompatibilna s bazom autoregresivnog LM. U ovom poslu predlažemo alternativu Mix i Match LM, koja se temelji na globalnim rezultatima za kontroliranu generaciju teksta koja kombinira arbitrarne predobučene crne kutije modele za ostvarivanje željenih atributa u proizvedenom tekstu bez uključenja bilo kakvih napravljenih ili strukturnih pretpostavki o modelima crne kutije. Mi interpretiramo zadatak kontrolirane generacije kao uzorke iz model a na energiji čije energetske vrijednosti su linearna kombinacija rezultata iz modela crne kutije koji su odvojeno odgovorni za tekućinu, kontrolnu atributu i vjernost svakom kontekstu uvjetnosti. Koristimo šemu uzoraka iz ovog model a koji se temelji na energiji koristeći bisdirektivni kontekst i globalne karakteristike. Potvrđujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa na različitim zadacima za reviziju teksta na kontroliranoj generaciji i stilu pod iznošenjem nedavno predloženih metoda uključujući dodatne obuke, finaliziranje ili ograničavajuće pretpostavke o obliku modela.', 'nl': 'Recent werk aan het genereren van gecontroleerde tekst heeft ofwel attributen-gebaseerde finetuning van het basistaalmodel (LM) vereist, ofwel heeft de parametrisering van de kenmerkdiscriminator beperkt om compatibel te zijn met de basis autoregressieve LM. In dit werk stellen we Mix and Match LM voor, een wereldwijd score-gebaseerd alternatief voor regelbare tekstgeneratie dat willekeurige vooraf getrainde black-box modellen combineert om de gewenste attributen in de gegenereerde tekst te bereiken zonder enige fine-tuning of structurele veronderstellingen over de black-box modellen. We interpreteren de taak van regelbare generatie als het trekken van monsters uit een energiegebaseerd model waarvan de energiewaarden een lineaire combinatie zijn van scores uit black-box modellen die afzonderlijk verantwoordelijk zijn voor vloeibaarheid, het controlekenmerk en de trouw aan elke conditionerende context. We gebruiken een Metropolis-Hastings sampling schema om uit dit energie-gebaseerde model te monsteren met behulp van bidirectionele context en globale attributen functies. We valideren de effectiviteit van onze aanpak op verschillende gecontroleerde generatie- en stijlgebaseerde tekstrevisietaken door recent voorgestelde methoden te overtreffen die extra training, fine-tuning of restrictieve aannames met betrekking tot de vorm van modellen vereisen.', 'bg': 'Последната работа по генериране на контролиран текст изисква или фина настройка на базовия езиков модел (LM), или ограничава параметризацията на дискриминатора на атрибутите, за да бъде съвместима с базовия авторегресивен LM. В тази работа предлагаме глобална алтернатива за генериране на контролируем текст, която съчетава произволни предварително обучени модели на черни кутии за постигане на желаните атрибути в генерирания текст, без да включва фина настройка или структурни предположения за моделите на черни кутии. Ние интерпретираме задачата за контролирано генериране като вземане на проби от енергийно базиран модел, чиито енергийни стойности са линейна комбинация от оценки от модели с черни кутии, които са отделно отговорни за плавността, контролния атрибут и вярността към всеки обусловен контекст. Използваме схема за вземане на проби Метрополис-Хейстингс, за да вземем проби от този енергийно базиран модел, използвайки двупосочен контекст и глобални характеристики на атрибутите. Ние валидираме ефективността на нашия подход при различни задачи за контролирано генериране и стилово базирани текстови ревизии, като превъзхождаме наскоро предложените методи, които включват допълнително обучение, фино настройване или ограничителни предположения пред формата на модели.', 'da': 'Seneste arbejde med kontrolleret tekstgenerering har enten krævet attributbaseret finjustering af basissprogmodellen (LM), eller har begrænset parameteriseringen af attributdiskriminatoren til at være kompatibel med basens autoregressive LM. I dette arbejde foreslår vi Mix and Match LM, et globalt scorebaseret alternativ til styrbar tekstgenerering, der kombinerer vilkårlige prætrænede sorte boksmodeller for at opnå de ønskede attributter i den genererede tekst uden at involvere nogen finjustering eller strukturelle antagelser om sorte boksmodeller. Vi fortolker opgaven med styrbar generering som at tegne prøver fra en energibaseret model, hvis energiværdier er en lineær kombination af scores fra sorte boksmodeller, der er separat ansvarlige for flydenhed, kontrolattributten og trofasthed til enhver konditioneringssammenhæng. Vi bruger en Metropolis-Hastings prøveudtagningsskema til at prøve fra denne energibaserede model ved hjælp af bidirektionel kontekst og globale attributfunktioner. Vi validerer effektiviteten af vores tilgang til forskellige kontrollerede generations- og stilbaserede tekstrevisionsopgaver ved at udføre nyligt foreslåede metoder, der indebærer ekstra træning, finjustering eller restriktive antagelser i form af modeller.', 'ko': '최근 제어된 텍스트 생성에 대한 작업은 기본 언어 모델(LM)에 대한 속성 기반 미세 조정을 요구하거나 속성 감별기의 매개 변수화와 기본 자귀환 LM 호환을 제한한다.이 작업에서 우리는 혼합 매칭 LM을 제기했다. 이것은 전역 점수를 바탕으로 제어할 수 있는 텍스트 생성 대체 방안이다. 이것은 임의로 미리 훈련된 블랙박스 모델을 결합시켜 생성된 텍스트에서 필요한 속성을 실현하고 블랙박스 모델에 대한 어떠한 미세한 조정이나 구조 가설도 언급하지 않는다.우리는 제어 가능한 생성 임무를 에너지를 바탕으로 하는 모델에서 샘플을 추출하는 것으로 해석할 것이다. 이 모델의 에너지 값은 블랙박스 모델 점수의 선형 조합이고 블랙박스 모델은 각각 유창성, 제어 속성과 그 어떠한 조건화 상하문에 대한 충실성을 책임진다.Metropolis-Hastings 샘플링 시나리오를 사용하여 양방향 컨텍스트 및 전역 속성 특성을 에너지 기반 모델에서 샘플링합니다.우리는 우리의 방법이 각종 제어된 생성과 스타일을 바탕으로 하는 텍스트 수정 임무에서의 유효성을 검증했다. 그 표현은 최근에 제시한 방법보다 우수하다. 이런 방법은 모델 형식에 대한 추가 훈련, 미세 조정 또는 제한적인 가설과 관련된다.', 'fa': 'کارهای اخیرا روی نسل متن کنترل نیاز دارد که به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای پایه\u200cای از مدل زبان پایه\u200cای (LM) تنظیم شود، یا پارامتریزی ویژه\u200cهای جدایی\u200cکننده را محدود کرده باشد که با LM پایه\u200cی خودگریزی\u200cکننده باشد. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد میکس و مسابقه LM را می\u200cدهیم، جایگزینی بر اساس امتیاز جهانی برای نسل متن کنترل قابل کنترل که مدل\u200cهای سیاه جعبه\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cشده\u200cای را برای رسیدن ویژه\u200cهای خواسته\u200cای در متن تولید می\u200cکند، بدون شامل هیچ فرضیه\u200cای که در مورد مدل\u200cهای سیاه جعبه\u200cهای سیاه ما وظیفه نسل کنترل قابل کنترل را به عنوان نمونه\u200cهای نقاشی از یک مدل بر اساس انرژی تفسیر می\u200cکنیم که ارزش انرژی آن یک ترکیب خطی از نمونه\u200cهای سیاه جعبه\u200cهای سیاه\u200cجعبه است که جداً مسئول آلودگی، ویژه کنترل و اعتماد به هر موقعیت شرای ما از نقشه نمونه\u200cهای متروپولیس-هیستینگ استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا از این مدل بر اساس انرژی با استفاده از نقشه\u200cهای مخصوص دوچرخه و ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای جهانی نمونه بگیریم. ما فعالیت روش\u200cهای ما را در مورد کارهای تغییر\u200cسازی از نسل\u200cهای کنترل و متن\u200cسازی متن\u200cسازی متن\u200cسازی متن\u200cسازی مختلف تصدیق می\u200cکنیم، با انجام رفتن روش\u200cهای پیشنهاد اخیرا که شامل تغییر\u200cسازی، تغییر\u200cسازی، یا فر', 'de': 'Jüngste Arbeiten zur kontrollierten Texterstellung haben entweder eine attributbasierte Feinabstimmung des Basissprachenmodells (LM) erforderlich gemacht oder die Parametrisierung des Attributdiskriminators eingeschränkt, um mit dem Basis-autoregressiven LM kompatibel zu sein. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir Mix and Match LM vor, eine globale score-basierte Alternative zur steuerbaren Texterstellung, die beliebige vortrainierte Black-Box-Modelle kombiniert, um die gewünschten Attribute im generierten Text zu erreichen, ohne irgendwelche Feinabstimmung oder strukturelle Annahmen über die Black-Box-Modelle einzubeziehen. Wir interpretieren die Aufgabe der steuerbaren Erzeugung als Muster aus einem energiebasierten Modell, dessen Energiewerte eine lineare Kombination von Scores aus Black-Box-Modellen sind, die separat für die Fluenz, das Steuerattribut und die Treue zu jedem Konditionierungskontext verantwortlich sind. Wir verwenden ein Metropolis-Hastings-Sampling-Schema, um aus diesem energiebasierten Modell zu entnehmen, wobei bidirektionaler Kontext und globale Attributfunktionen verwendet werden. Wir validieren die Effektivität unseres Ansatzes bei verschiedenen Aufgaben zur kontrollierten Generierung und stilbasierten Textrevision, indem wir kürzlich vorgeschlagene Methoden übertreffen, die zusätzliche Schulungen, Feinabstimmungen oder restriktive Annahmen über die Form von Modellen beinhalten.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan baru-baru ini pada generasi teks terkendali telah membutuhkan penyesuaian terbatas berdasarkan atribut dari model bahasa dasar (LM), atau telah membatasi parameterisasi atribut diskriminator untuk kompatibel dengan LM self-regresif dasar. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan Mix and Match LM, sebuah alternatif global berdasarkan skor untuk generasi teks yang dapat dikendalikan yang menggabungkan model kotak hitam prapelatih arbitrari untuk mencapai atribut yang diinginkan dalam teks yang dibuat tanpa melibatkan asumsi fine-tuning atau struktural tentang model kotak hitam. We interpret the task of controllable generation as drawing samples from an energy-based model whose energy values are a linear combination of scores from black-box models that are separately responsible for fluency, the control attribute, and faithfulness to any conditioning context.  Kami menggunakan skema sampel Metropolis-Hastings untuk sampel dari model berdasarkan energi ini menggunakan konteks bidireksi dan fitur atribut global. Kami mengkvalifikasi efektivitas pendekatan kita pada berbagai generasi terkendali dan tugas revisi teks berdasarkan gaya dengan melampaui cara yang baru-baru ini diusulkan yang melibatkan pelatihan ekstra, penyesuaian, atau asumsi restriktif atas bentuk model.', 'tr': "Ýakynda kontrol edilen metin dörediginde işlem ýa-da atribut tabanly takyklaýan etiket modelini (LM) ýädä, ýa-da otoregressiv LM bilen uyumlu bolmak üçin atribut diskriminatöriniň parameteriýasyny çykardy. Bu işde Mix and Match LM'i nusgala edip bilýän tekst döredilmesi üçin dünýäpli taýýarlanan bir alternatiw tekst döredilmesi üçin nusgala täblisaň ön-täblisaň gara-box modellerini janlaşdyrmak üçin isleýän tekst üçin bir nusgala alýar. Biz kontrol edilen döwletlerin işini enerji tabanly nusgadan çykarýan nusgalar şeklinde çykarýarys. enerji mykdarlarynyň black-box modellerinden paýlaşylyk, kontrol atributi we her ähli şartlaşdyrma kontekstinden boýunça hasaplanýarlar. Biz Metropolis-Hastings nusgalaryny bu enerji daýanýan nusgalardan çykarmak üçin bu nusgalary çykarýarys. Biz yaklaşymyzyň etkinliýetini dürli kontrol eden döwletlere we stillerde metin revisiýasynyň görevlerini oňa görkezmäge täsirli täsirlerimizi tassyklaýarys. Şu wagt geçirmek, düzeltmek we nusgasyzlyk şeklinde örän nusgasytlary bar.", 'af': "Onlangse werk op kontroleerde teks generasie het of benodig attribute-baseerde fyn-tuning van die basis taal model (LM), of het die parameterisasie van die attribute diskrimineerder beperk om te wees kompatibel met die basis autoregressief LM. In hierdie werk, ons voorstel Miskien en ooreenstem LM, 'n globaal punt-gebaseerde alternatief vir beheerbaar teks genereering wat arbitrieële voorafgeleerde swart-boks modele kombinieer om die verlang eienskappe in die genereerde teks te bereik sonder om enige fyn-tuning of strukturele voorstellings oor die swart-boks modelle te invoer. Ons uittel die taak van beheerbare generasie as teken voorbeelde van 'n energie-gebaseerde model wie se energiewaardes is 'n lineêre kombinasie van telling van swart-boks modele wat aparte verantwoordelik is vir fluiditeit, die beheer-eienskap en getrouheid tot enige voorwaardes. Ons gebruik 'n Metropolis-Hastings-samplingsskema om voorbeeld te maak van hierdie energie-gebaseerde model te gebruik bidireksjoneel konteks en globale eienskappe funksies. Ons bevestig die effektiviteit van ons toegang op verskeie kontroleerde generasie en stylbaseerde teks hersiening opdragte deur die uitvoer van onlangs voorgestelde metodes wat ekstra oefening, fintuning of beperkende aanvaardings oor die vorm van modele aansluit.", 'sw': 'Recent work on controlled text generation has either required attribute-based fine-tuning of the base language model (LM), or has restricted the parameterization of the attribute discriminator to be compatible with the base autoregressive LM.  Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza Mix na Mathamini LM, mbadala wa kipindi cha kimataifa kinachosimamia kwa kizazi cha teknolojia kinachodhibiti kinachounganisha mifano ya vifaa vya kiweusi kwa ajili ya kutekeleza vifaa vinavyohitajika katika ujumbe uliotengenezwa bila kuhusiana na dhana yoyote yenye mafunzo au mifumo yenye meusi. Tunafsiri jukumu la vizazi vinavyodhibiti kama vile kuchora sampuli kutoka modeli yenye msingi wa nishati ambazo thamani zake za nishati ni mchanganyiko wa msingi kutoka kwenye mitindo ya kisasa nyeusi ambazo ni tofauti kwa ajili ya ufanisi, utaratibu wa udhibiti, na uaminifu kwa mazingira yoyote. Tunatumia mpango wa sampuli wa mijini-Hastings ili kufanya sampuli kutoka kwenye mtindo huu wa nishati kwa kutumia mazingira ya kiutaratibu na vipengele vya kidunia. Tunaweza kuthibitisha ufanisi wa hatua yetu kwenye kazi za mabadiliko ya vizazi vinavyodhibitiwa na mtindo wa simu kwa kutekeleza mbinu zilizopendekezwa hivi karibuni zinazohusisha mafunzo ya ziada, mafunzo mazuri, au dhana yenye vizuizi juu ya namna ya mifano.', 'sq': 'Puna e fundit në gjenerimin e kontrolluar të tekstit ka kërkuar ose rregullimin e modelit të gjuhës bazë (LM) bazuar në atribute ose ka kufizuar parametrizimin e diskriminuesit të atributeve për të qenë kompatibil me LM bazë autoregressive. Në këtë punë, propozojmë Mix and Match LM, një alternativë globale bazuar në rezultate për gjenerimin e kontrollueshëm të tekstit që kombinon modele arbitrarë të paratrajnuar të kutisë së zezë për arritjen e atributeve të dëshiruara në tekstin e gjeneruar pa përfshirë ndonjë rregullim të hollësishëm apo supozime strukturore rreth modeleve të kutisë së zezë. Ne interpretojmë detyrën e gjenerimit të kontrollueshëm si të vizatojmë mostra nga një model bazuar në energji, vlerat e të cilit energji janë një kombinim linear të rezultateve nga modelet e kutisë së zezë që janë veçan ërisht përgjegjës për fluencën, atributin e kontrollit dhe besnikërinë ndaj çdo konteksti kondicionues. Ne përdorim një skemë kampionari Metropolis-Hastings për të provuar nga ky model i bazuar në energji duke përdorur kontekstin dy-drejtues dhe karakteristikat globale të atributeve. Ne e vlerësojmë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë në punët e ndryshme të gjeneratës së kontrolluar dhe të revizionit të tekstit të bazuar në stil duke përmirësuar metodat e propozuara kohët e fundit që përfshijnë trainimin shtesë, rregullimin apo supozimet kufizuese lidhur me form ën e modeleve.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ መክፈቻን እና መተካት LM፣ የዓለምነዊ score-based የጽሑፍ ትውልድ ማቀናጃ፣ የተማረከ ቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ ጥቁር-box ሞዴላዎችን ለማግኘት በተፈቀደ ጽሑፍ ውስጥ የተፈቀደ የፊደል ጥቁር-box ምሳሌዎችን ለማግኘት እና በጥቁር-box ሞዴላዎችን ለማግኘት የሚፈልገውን የፊደል ምርጫዎችን ማግኘት እና ማስተካከል እና መ የሥልጣን ትውልድ ምሳሌዎችን ከenergy-ተመሳሳይ ምሳሌ መቀላቀል እናስተራርጋለን፤ የenergy ግምገማዎች ዋናዎች ከጥቁር-box ዓይነቶች የተለየ ጥቁር እና ለጥቁር አካባቢ እና ለፍጥረት፣ ለመቆጣጠር ስርዓት እና ማመንት ለሁሉ ክፍተት ነው፡፡ የሜትሮፖሊስ-ሐስቲን ምሳሌ ፕሮግራሙን እና አቀፍ የፍትሕት ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም ከዚህች የenergy-based model ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የልዩ ልዩ ትውልድ እና የጽሑፍ አድራሻ ስራዎችን በተለየ ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջերս կառավարվող տեքստի ստեղծման վրա կատարված աշխատանքները պահանջել են կամ հիմնական լեզվի մոդելի (LM) առանձնահատկություններով հիմնված բարելավումներ, կամ սահմանափակել են առանձնահատկությունների խտրակիչի պարամետրիզացիա, որպեսզի համատեղվեն Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք խառնել և համապատասխանել LM-ին, գլոբալ արդյունքների հիմնված այլընտրանք վերահսկելի տեքստի ստեղծման համար, որը համադրում է կամավոր նախկին պատրաստված սև արկղի մոդելներ ստեղծված տեքստում ցանկացած առանձնահատկությունների հասնելու համար առանց ներառելու որև Մենք վերլուծում ենք վերահսկելի սերունդի խնդիրը որպես էներգիայի հիմնված մոդելի նմուշներ նկարել, որի էներգիայի արժեքները սև արկղի մոդելների գծային համակցություն են, որոնք առանձին պատասխանատու են հեղության, վերահսկողական առանձնահատկության և հավատարմության ցանկացած պա Մենք օգտագործում ենք Մետրոպոլիս-Հեյսթինսի նմուշներ վերցնելու ծրագիր, որպեսզի նմուշներ վերցնենք այս էներգիայի հիմնված մոդելի վրա, օգտագործելով երկու ուղղությամբ կոնտեքստ և գլոբա Մենք ստուգում ենք մեր մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը տարբեր վերահսկվող սերունդների և ոճի հիմնված տեքստի վերանայման խնդիրների վրա վերաբերյալ վերջերս առաջարկված մեթոդների արտադրողությունը, որոնք ներառում են ավելին վարժություններ, բարելավումներ կամ սահման', 'az': "Müdafiə edilmiş mətn nəzəriyyətində yeni işlər ya indirilmiş dil modelinin (LM) təmizlənməsi ehtiyacıdır, ya da təmizlənməsi üçün təmizlənməsi üçün təmizlənməsi ehtiyacıdır. Bu işdə, biz Mix and Match LM'i, qara qutusu modelleri haqqında müxtəlif təhsil edilmiş qara qutusu modellərini əlavə etmək üçün müəyyən edilən müəyyən edilə bilən mətn nəzəriyyəti üçün qlobal score-based alternatifi təklif edirik. Biz müdafiə edilən nəsillərin işini enerji-tabanlı modelindən çəkən nümunələr kimi çəkiririk. Enerji qiymətləri hər bir conditioning məlumatına təkrar sorumlu olan siyah qutusu modellerindən linear nümunələrin kombinatsiyası olaraq çəkiririk. Biz Metropolis-Hastings nümunələrini bu enerji modelinin nümunələrindən istifadə edirik ki, bu nümunələri ikidirektiv kontekst və qlobal təsəvvür özelliklərindən istifadə edirik. Biz müxtəlif təşkil edilmiş nəsillərə və stillərə təşkil edilmiş metin yenidən təşkil edilmiş metodların üstünlüyü ilə müxtəlif təşkil edilməsini təsdiqləyirik.", 'bn': 'নিয়ন্ত্রিত টেক্সট প্রজন্মের উপর সম্প্রতি কাজের বৈশিষ্ট্য ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভাষার মডেল (এলএম) প্রয়োজন, অথবা বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈষম্যের মাত্রিক বৈষম্যে এই কাজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি মিক্স এবং মিচ এলএম, যা নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা লেখা প্রজন্মের জন্য বিশ্ব স্কোর-ভিত্তিক বিকল্প যা ব্ল্যাক-বাক্সের পূর্ববর্তী প্রশিক্ষিত কালো বাক্স মডেলের সাথে সম্ আমরা নিয়ন্ত্রিত প্রজন্মের কাজের ব্যাখ্যা করি একটি শক্তিভিত্তিক মডেল থেকে নমুনা আঁকা যার শক্তি মান কালো বাক্স মডেল থেকে লাইনিয়ার মিনিট যা ব্ল্যাক-বক্সের মো আমরা একটি মেট্রোপোলিস-হ্যাস্টিং সাম্পলিক পরিকল্পনা ব্যবহার করি এই শক্তিভিত্তিক মডেল থেকে উদাহরণ ব্যবহার করি বিটারেক্টিকেশনের প্ আমরা বিভিন্ন নিয়ন্ত্রিত প্রজন্ম এবং স্টাইল ভিত্তিক টেক্সট পরিবর্তনের কাজের উপর আমাদের পদক্ষেপের কার্যক্রম পরিচালিত করি সম্প্রতি প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি প্রদর্', 'cs': 'Nedávné práce na řízené generování textu vyžadovaly buď jemné ladění modelu základního jazyka (LM), nebo omezily parametrizaci diskriminátoru atributů tak, aby byla kompatibilní se základní autoregresivní LM. V této práci navrhujeme Mix and Match LM, globální skóre založenou alternativu pro kontrolovatelné generování textu, která kombinuje libovolné předtrénované black-box modely pro dosažení požadovaných atributů v generovaném textu bez zahrnutí jakéhokoliv jemného ladění nebo strukturálních předpokladů o černých skříňkách modelů. Úkol ovladatelné generace interpretujeme jako čerpání vzorků z energetického modelu, jehož energetické hodnoty jsou lineární kombinací skóre z černých skříňek modelů, které jsou samostatně zodpovědné za plynulost, řídicí atribut a věrnost jakémukoli kontextu podmínek. K vzorkování z tohoto energetického modelu používáme schéma vzorkování Metropolis-Hastings s využitím obousměrného kontextu a globálních atributů. Ověřujeme efektivitu našeho přístupu u různých úkolů řízené generace a stylové revize textů tím, že překonáváme nedávno navržené metody, které zahrnují další školení, jemné ladění nebo restriktivní předpoklady nad formou modelů.', 'bs': 'Nedavni rad na kontroliranoj generaciji teksta ili je potrebno ispravno prilagođenje baznog jezičkog modela (LM) na atributu, ili je ograničio parameterizaciju diskriminacije atributa da bude kompatibilna sa baznom autoregresivnom LM-om. U ovom poslu predlažemo alternativu Mix i Match LM, koja se temelji na globalnim rezultatima za kontroliranu generaciju teksta koja kombinira arbitrarne predobučene crne kutije modele za ostvarivanje željenih atributa u proizvedenom tekstu bez uključuvanja bilo kakvih finalnih ili strukturnih pretpostavki o modelima crne kutije. Mi interpretiramo zadatak kontrolirane generacije kao uzorke iz model a na energiji čije energetske vrijednosti su linearna kombinacija rezultata iz modela crne kutije koji su odvojeno odgovorni za tekućinu, atributu kontrole i vjernost svakom kontekstu uvjetnosti. Koristimo šemu uzoraka iz ovog model a na energiji koristeći bisdirektivni kontekst i globalne karakteristike atributa. Potvrđujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa na različitim zadacima za reviziju teksta na kontroliranoj generaciji i stilu pod iznošenjem nedavno predloženih metoda koje uključuju dodatne obuke, finaliziranje ili ograničavajuće pretpostavke o obliku modela.', 'ca': "La feina recent sobre la generació de textos controlats ha requerit una adaptació basada en atributs del model de llenguatge bàsic (LM), o ha restringit la parametrització del discriminator d'atributs per ser compatible amb la base de LM autoregressiu. En aquesta feina, proposem Mix and Match LM, una alternativa global basada en puntuacions per a generar text controlable que combina models arbitraris de caixa negra pré-entrenats per aconseguir els atributs desitjats en el text generat sense implicar cap ajustament o suposicions estructurals sobre els models de caixa negra. Interpretem la tasca de la generació controlable com dibuixant mostres d'un model basat en l'energia cuyos valors energètics són una combinació linear de puntuacions de models de caixa negra que són responsables separadament de la fluïtat, l'atribut de control i la fidelitat a qualsevol context condicionat. Utilitzem un esquema de recolliment de mostres de Metropolis-Hastings per recollir mostres d'aquest model basat en l'energia utilitzant un context bidireccional i característiques d'atributs globals. Validim l'eficacia del nostre enfocament en diverses tasques de revisió de textos basades en generació controlada i estil, superant els mètodes proposats recentment que impliquen formació extra, ajustes o suposicions restrictives sobre la forma de models.", 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset kontrolloidun tekstin generoinnin työt ovat joko vaatineet peruskielimallin (LM) attribuuttipohjaista hienosäätöä tai rajoittaneet attribuuttipohjaimen parametrisoinnin yhteensopivuuteen peruskielen autoregressiivisen LM:n kanssa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme Mix and Match LM:tä, globaalia pisteytyspohjaista vaihtoehtoa hallittavalle tekstille, jossa yhdistyvät mielivaltaiset esikoulutetut mustalaatikon mallit halutuiden attribuuttien saavuttamiseksi luodussa tekstissä ilman hienosäätöä tai rakenteellisia oletuksia mustalaatikon malleista. Tulkitsemme hallittavan tuotannon tehtävän piirtämällä näytteitä energiapohjaisesta mallista, jonka energiaarvot ovat lineaarinen yhdistelmä mustan laatikon mallien pisteitä, jotka ovat erikseen vastuussa sujuvuudesta, kontrolli-attribuutista ja uskollisuudesta mihin tahansa ehdollistamiseen liittyvään kontekstiin. Käytämme Metropolis-Hastingsin näytteenottojärjestelmää ottaaksemme näytteitä tästä energiapohjaisesta mallista käyttäen kaksisuuntaista kontekstia ja globaaleja attribuuttiominaisuuksia. Validoimme lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden erilaisissa kontrolloiduissa sukupolvi- ja tyylipohjaisissa tekstitarkistustehtävissä suoriutumalla hiljattain ehdotetuista menetelmistä, jotka sisältävät lisäkoulutusta, hienosäätöä tai rajoittavia oletuksia mallien muodossa.', 'et': 'Hiljutine kontrollitud teksti genereerimise töö on kas nõudnud baaskeele mudeli (LM) atribuudipõhist peenhäälestust või on piiranud atribuudi diskrimineerimise parameetrisse, et see oleks ühilduv baaskeele autoregressiivsele LM-ile. Selles töös pakume välja Mix and Match LM, globaalne skooripõhine alternatiiv juhitava teksti genereerimiseks, mis ühendab meelevaldseid eeltreenitud mustkasti mudeleid soovitud atribuutide saavutamiseks genereeritud tekstis, ilma et see hõlmaks ühtki peenhäälestust või struktuurilisi eeldusi mustkasti mudelite kohta. Tõlgendame kontrollitava tootmise ülesannet energiapõhise mudeli näidiste võtmisena, mille energiaväärtused on lineaarne kombinatsioon mustkasti mudelite skooridest, mis eraldi vastutavad sujuva, kontrolli atribuudi ja ustavuse eest mis tahes konditsioneerimiskontekstis. Sellest energiapõhisest mudelist proovivõtmiseks kasutame Metropolis-Hastingsi valimisskeemi, kasutades kahesuunalist konteksti ja globaalseid atribuudi funktsioone. Me kinnitame oma lähenemisviisi tõhusust mitmesuguste kontrollitud generatsiooni- ja stiilipõhiste teksti läbivaatamisülesannete puhul, ületades hiljuti väljapakutud meetodeid, mis hõlmavad lisakoolitust, peenhäälestust või piiravaid eeldusi mudelite vormi suhtes.', 'jv': 'Label In this job, we proposal Mix and Match LM, a global punctuation-supported Alternate for control able text Generation Awak dhéwé ngerngerti dadi nggambar penting nggambar penting manut Awak dhéwé nggunaké sampling nggo Metrolis-Kasings nggo sampler ning model iki dadi nggawe aturan sing basa dikenayral karo atiribute global. Awak dhéwé nglanggar efek dadi aturan awak dhéwé nggawe nguasai perusahaan anyar tentang karo hal-bawih bantuan nggawe ngubah dhéwé, iso nggawe ngerasai perusahaan maneh sing isiné, iso nggawe gerakan, nggawe nguasai perusahaan anyar sampek model.', 'sk': 'Nedavno delo na področju generiranja nadzorovanega besedila je zahtevalo natančno nastavitev osnovnega jezikovnega modela (LM) na podlagi atributov ali omejilo parametrizacijo diskriminatorja atributov, da bi bila združljiva z osnovnim avtoregresivnim LM. V tem delu predlagamo Mix and Match LM, globalno rezultatno alternativo za nadzorovano generiranje besedila, ki združuje poljubne vnaprej usposobljene modele črnih polj za doseganje želenih atributov v ustvarjenem besedilu, ne da bi vključevale kakršne koli fine nastavitve ali strukturne predpostavke o modelih črnih polj. Naloga nadzorovane generacije interpretiramo kot risanje vzorcev iz energetskega modela, katerega energetske vrednosti so linearna kombinacija rezultatov iz modelov črnih škatlic, ki so ločeno odgovorni za tekočost, kontrolni atribut in zvestobo vsakemu kontekstu pogojevanja. Uporabljamo shemo vzorčenja Metropolis-Hastings za vzorčenje iz tega energetskega modela z uporabo dvosmernega konteksta in funkcij globalnih atributov. Učinkovitost našega pristopa pri različnih nalogah nadzorovane generacije in slogovne revizije besedila potrjujemo tako, da presegamo nedavno predlagane metode, ki vključujejo dodatno usposabljanje, natančno nastavitev ali omejevalne predpostavke glede oblike modelov.', 'ha': "Yin aikin da aka canza tsarin matsayin da aka lissafa, yana da amfani da mai gyare-gyare-gyare-salon na asalin harshen (LM), ko kuma ya ƙayyade parameterization ga mai nuna wa halin don ya sami da kuma a asalin LM mai gamuwa. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa Mix da Match LM, wata shidala mai tsaya a cikin kwanan kwanan wata matsayi na ƙidãya wa zaɓen matsayin na tsari wanda ke haɗa misãlai masu tsari da aka yi wa zaman-wa-mai-haƙƙin baƙi dõmin ya gaskata halin da aka ƙayyade cikin matsayin da aka ƙãga, kuma bã su haɗa wani zato mai kyau-tun ko wani zato na ƙidãya na zato game da misalin-box mai baƙi. Tuna bayyana aikin kizayen wanda ke iya lissafa kamar yin ruwan misãlai daga wata misali wanda ke asanin nishati, wanda kimar ajiya za'a zama koma mai linja daga misalin akwatin baƙi waɗanda ke da ɗabi'a wa masu tsari ga masu buƙata, masu tsarin maɓallin Control, da gaskiya zuwa wani muhalli na muhalli. Tuna yi amfani da wani shirin misãlai na Metroolis-Hastins don mu sami daga wannan misalin a kan nishatin da za'a yi amfani da wasu kewayen tsaro na kimar. Tuna gyãra game da aikin mu a kan wasu masu tsari na danne da misalin mai tsaro na rubutu da misãlai, ko kuma mu gyãra game da shiryoyin da aka buƙata a yanzu-yanzu masu aikin da aka yi musamman da su ƙara wa zaman aikin da ake yi wa musammali.", 'bo': 'Recent work on controlled text generation has either required attribute-based fine-tuning of the base language model (LM), or has restricted the parameterization of the attribute discriminator to be compatible with the base autoregressive LM. In this work, we propose Mix and Match LM, a global score-based alternative for controllable text generation that combines arbitrary pre-trained black-box models for achieving the desired attributes in the generated text without involving any fine-tuning or structural assumptions about the black-box models. We interpret the task of controllable generation as drawing samples from an energy-based model whose energy values are a linear combination of scores from black-box models that are separately responsible for fluency, the control attribute, and faithfulness to any conditioning context. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྣེ་འཁོར་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ནི་་་ ནུས་པས་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་བྱས་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་འདིའ ང་ཚོས་དབུས་མཐུན་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ལ་སྣེ་མཐུན་བཟོས་མིན་འདུག', 'he': 'העבודה האחרונה על יוצר טקסט שולט ביקשה או שינוי מיוחד מבוסס על תכונות של מודל השפה הבסיסית (LM), או מגביל את הפרמטריזציה של המבדל של תכונות כדי להיות מתאים לבסיס LM אוטומגרסיבי. In this work, we propose Mix and Match LM, a global score-based alternative for controllable text generation that combines arbitrary pre-trained black-box models for achieving the desired attributes in the generated text without involving any fine-tuning or structural assumptions about the black-box models.  אנו מפרשים את המשימה של הדור השליטה כציירת דגימות ממודל מבוסס באנרגיה שיעריך האנרגיה שלהם הם שילוב לינרי של נקודות ממודלים של קופסת שחורה שאחראים באופן נפרד על נוזנות, תכונות השליטה, ואמינות לכל קשר מתאים. אנו משתמשים בתכנית דגימות מטרופוליס-הייסטינגס כדי לדגימות מדוגמנית מבוססת אנרגיה זו בשימוש בקשר שתי כיוונים ואיכויים גלובליים. אנו מאשרים את היעילות של הגישה שלנו על משימות של דור שולט ומבוססים בסגנון טקסט משותפות על ידי ביצוע שיטות מוצעות לאחרונה'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'مختلفة جدًا ولكنها متشابهة جدًا! نقل نمط النص المقيد غير الخاضع للإشراف', 'es': '¡Tan diferentes pero tan parecidos! Transferencia restringida de estilos de texto sin supervisión', 'fr': 'Si différents mais si semblables\xa0! Transfert de style de texte non supervisé avec contrainte', 'pt': 'Tão Diferentes Mas Tão Iguais! Transferência de estilo de texto não supervisionada restrita', 'ja': 'これまでとは違う、それでも似ている！監視されていない制約付きテキストスタイル転送', 'hi': 'इतना अलग अभी तक इतना समान है! सीमित अप्रशिक्षित पाठ शैली स्थानांतरण', 'zh': '如此不同,又如此相似! 受约束者无监督文本式传输', 'ru': 'Так по-другому, но так похоже! Ограниченный неконтролируемый перенос стиля текста', 'ga': 'Chomh Éagsúil Ach Mar sin Féin! Aistriú Stíl Téacs Neamh-mhaoirsithe srianta', 'ka': 'რჲლკჲგა პაჱლთფნჲ ჟყღჲ. შედგენებული ტექსტის სტილის გადატანა', 'hu': 'Annyira különböző, mégis annyira hasonló! Korlátozott, felügyeletlen szövegstílusátvitel', 'el': 'Τόσο διαφορετικός αλλά τόσο όμορφος! Περιορισμένη μη εποπτευόμενη μεταφορά στυλ κειμένου', 'it': 'Così diverso eppure così uguale! Trasferimento di stile di testo non monitorato vincolato', 'lt': 'Toks skirtingas, bet toks panašus! Ribotas nekontroliuojamas teksto stiliaus perdavimas', 'kk': 'Бірақ бір-бірінше! Сақталмаған мәтін стилін тасымалдау', 'mk': 'Толку различно, но толку природно! Constrained Unsupervised Text Style Transfer', 'mt': 'So Different Yet So Alike!  Trasferiment ristrett tal-istil tat-test mhux sorveljat', 'ms': 'Begitu berbeza, tetapi begitu sama! Pemindahan Gaya Teks Tidak Diterkendalikan', 'ml': 'അതുകൊണ്ട് വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ് എന്നിട്ടും അതുകൊണ്ട് മാത്രം! പരിശീലനിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത പദാവലി ശൈലി മാറ്റുക', 'mn': 'Гэхдээ өөр өөр зүйл нь тийм ч адилхан! Хязгаарлагдсан мөн хэлбэрийг дамжуулах', 'pl': 'Takie inne, ale takie podobne! Ograniczony nienadzorowany transfer stylów tekstu', 'ro': 'Atât de diferit, dar atât de asemănător! Transfer de stil text nesupravegheat constrâns', 'no': 'Så forskjellig enno så like! Avgrensa tekststiloverføring', 'sr': 'Tako drugaèije, tako slièno! Ограничен неподржан трансфер стила текста', 'sv': 'Så annorlunda men lika! Begränsad överföring av icke övervakad textformatmall', 'ta': 'எனவே வேறு வித்தியாசமாக இருந்தாலும் அதே சமமாக! கண்காணிக்கப்படாத உரை பாணியை மாற்று', 'so': 'Halkaas oo kalena sidaas oo kale Isku wareejinta qoraalka ee aan la ilaalinayn', 'ur': 'تو ایک دوسرے کے برابر ہیں محدود نہیں ہوئی متن استیل ترنسفور', 'si': 'තවමත් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙන්නේ! සීමාවිත නැති පාළුවේ ස්ථානය ස්ථානය', 'uz': "Shunday qilib, har xil bo'lgan! Koʻrsatilmagan matn uslubi", 'vi': 'So different yet So Alike! NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'da': 'Så anderledes, men så lige! Begrænset overførsel af ikke-overvåget tekststil', 'hr': 'Tako drugačije, tako slično! Prebacivanje neodređenog teksta stila', 'bg': 'Толкова различни, но еднакви! Ограничен пренос на текстов стил без надзор', 'nl': 'Zo verschillend maar zo gelijkaardig! Beperkte overdracht van niet-beheerde tekststijl', 'id': 'Begitu berbeda namun begitu asing! Transfer Gaya Teks Tak Terkendali Terbatas', 'ko': '이렇게 다르고 또 이렇게 비슷해!제한된 비감독 텍스트 스타일 변환', 'fa': 'پس متفاوت و متفاوت تغییر استیل متن محدود نشده', 'de': 'So anders und doch so ähnlich! Eingeschränkte Übertragung von nicht überwachten Textstilen', 'sw': 'Kina tofauti na hata hivyo! Transfer Style ya Kitaarifa', 'tr': 'Henüz Tüzelikli Tüzelikli! Saklanmaýan Metin Biçiminden Çaşyrymy', 'af': 'So Verskillende Nog So Alike! Gebeperkte Onondersteunde Teks Styl Oordrag', 'sq': 'Kaq ndryshe por kaq të ngjashme! Transferim i kufizuar i stilit të tekstit pa mbikqyrje', 'am': 'So Different Yet So Alike!  undo-type', 'hy': 'So Different Yet So Alike!  Անսահմանափակ թեքստային ոճի փոխանցումը', 'bn': 'So Different Yet So Alike!  প্রশিক্ষিত টেক্সট স্টাইল পরিবর্তন', 'ca': "Tan diferent però tan alí! Transfer ència restringida d'estil de text sense supervisió", 'cs': 'Tak odlišný a přesto tak podobný! Omezený přenos textových stylů bez dohledu', 'et': 'Nii erinev, kuid samasugune! Piiratud järelevalveta tekstistiili ülekanne', 'fi': 'Niin erilainen, mutta niin samanlainen! Rajoitettu valvomaton tekstityylisiirto', 'az': 'Bel…ô olduqda baŇüqa-baŇüqa eyni ola bil…ôr ! QńĪdńĪrńĪlmńĪŇü M…ôtn Usluńüu Transferi', 'bs': 'Tako drugačije, tako slično! Prebacivanje neodređenog teksta stila', 'jv': 'Ero, njuk saiki panggon liyo soko Alike ! structural navigation', 'sk': 'Tako drugačen, a tako enak! Omejen prenos sloga besedila brez nadzora', 'ha': 'Kamar wancan ne mutãne suka halaka. @ action', 'he': 'So Different Yet So Alike!  העברת סגנון טקסט לא מוגבלת', 'bo': 'དེ་བས་ནའང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་གཞན་ཞིག་རེད། ཚད་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་སྲུང་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་བཟོས་གཞུང་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན'}
{'en': 'Traditionally, a debate usually requires a manual preparation process, including reading plenty of articles, selecting the claims, identifying the stances of the claims, seeking the evidence for the claims, etc. As the AI debate attracts more attention these years, it is worth exploring the methods to automate the tedious process involved in the debating system. In this work, we introduce a comprehensive and large dataset named IAM, which can be applied to a series of argument mining tasks, including claim extraction, stance classification, evidence extraction, etc. Our dataset is collected from over 1k articles related to 123 topics. Near 70k sentences in the dataset are fully annotated based on their argument properties (e.g., claims, stances, evidence, etc.). We further propose two new integrated argument mining tasks associated with the debate preparation process: (1) claim extraction with stance classification (CESC) and (2) claim-evidence pair extraction (CEPE). We adopt a pipeline approach and an end-to-end method for each integrated task separately. Promising experimental results are reported to show the values and challenges of our proposed tasks, and motivate future research on argument mining.', 'ar': 'أصبح النقل التلقائي للنص بين المجالات شائعًا في الآونة الأخيرة. أحد أهدافها هو الحفاظ على المحتوى الدلالي أثناء التكيف مع المجال الهدف. ومع ذلك ، فإنه لا يحتفظ صراحةً بسمات أخرى بين المصدر والنص المترجم: على سبيل المثال ، طول النص والوصف. الحفاظ على القيود في النقل له العديد من التطبيقات النهائية ، بما في ذلك زيادة البيانات وتصحيح الحواف. نقدم طريقة لنقل نمط النص المقيد غير الخاضع للإشراف من خلال إدخال خسارتين تكميليتين لمجموعة نماذج شبكة الخصومة التوليدية (GAN). على عكس الخسائر المتنافسة المستخدمة في شبكات GAN ، فإننا نقدم خسائر تعاونية حيث يتعاون المميّز والمولد ويقللان من نفس الخسارة. الأول هو الخسارة المتباينة والثاني هو فقدان التصنيف - بهدف تنظيم الفضاء الكامن بشكل أكبر وتقريب الجمل المماثلة من بعضها البعض. نوضح أن هذا التدريب يحتفظ بالقيود المعجمية والنحوية والمحددة المجال بين المجالات لمجموعات بيانات معيارية متعددة ، بما في ذلك تلك التي تتغير فيها أكثر من سمة واحدة. نظهر أن الخسائر التعاونية التكميلية تعمل على تحسين جودة النص ، وفقًا لمقاييس التقييم الآلي والبشرية.', 'es': 'La transferencia automática de texto entre dominios se ha hecho popular en los últimos tiempos. Uno de sus objetivos es preservar el contenido semántico mientras se adapta al dominio objetivo. Sin embargo, no mantiene explícitamente otros atributos entre el texto original y el traducido: por ejemplo, la longitud y la descriptividad del texto. El mantenimiento de las restricciones en la transferencia tiene varias aplicaciones posteriores, que incluyen el aumento y la desactivación de datos. Introducimos un método para dicha transferencia restringida de estilos de texto sin supervisión mediante la introducción de dos pérdidas complementarias a la familia de modelos de la red generativa de adversarios (GAN). A diferencia de las pérdidas competidoras utilizadas en las GAN, introducimos pérdidas cooperativas en las que el discriminador y el generador cooperan y reducen la misma pérdida. La primera es una pérdida de contraste y la segunda es una pérdida de clasificación, con el objetivo de regularizar aún más el espacio latente y acercar frases similares. Demostramos que dicha capacitación mantiene las restricciones léxicas, sintácticas y específicas de dominio entre los dominios para múltiples conjuntos de datos de referencia, incluidos aquellos en los que cambia más de un atributo. Demostramos que las pérdidas cooperativas complementarias mejoran la calidad del texto, de acuerdo con las medidas de evaluación automatizadas y humanas.', 'fr': "Le transfert automatique de texte entre domaines est devenu populaire ces derniers temps. L'un de ses objectifs est de préserver le contenu sémantique tout en s'adaptant au domaine cible. Cependant, il ne conserve pas explicitement d'autres attributs entre le texte source et le texte traduit, par exemple, la longueur et le caractère descriptif du texte. Le maintien des contraintes dans le transfert a plusieurs applications en aval, notamment l'augmentation des données et le débiaisage. Nous présentons une méthode pour un tel transfert de style de texte non supervisé sous contrainte en introduisant deux pertes complémentaires dans la famille de modèles de réseau antagoniste génératif (GAN). Contrairement aux pertes concurrentes utilisées dans les GaN, nous introduisons des pertes coopératives dans lesquelles le discriminateur et le générateur coopèrent et réduisent la même perte. Le premier est une perte contrastive et le second est une perte de classification, visant à régulariser davantage l'espace latent et à rapprocher des phrases similaires. Nous démontrons qu'une telle formation conserve les contraintes lexicales, syntaxiques et spécifiques au domaine entre les domaines pour plusieurs ensembles de données de référence, y compris ceux où plusieurs attributs changent. Nous montrons que les pertes coopératives complémentaires améliorent la qualité du texte, selon des mesures d'évaluation automatisées et humaines.", 'pt': 'A transferência automática de texto entre domínios tornou-se popular nos últimos tempos. Um de seus objetivos é preservar o conteúdo semântico enquanto se adapta ao domínio de destino. No entanto, não mantém explicitamente outros atributos entre a fonte e o texto traduzido: por exemplo, comprimento do texto e descritividade. A manutenção de restrições na transferência tem vários aplicativos de downstream, incluindo aumento de dados e debiasing. Introduzimos um método para tal transferência restrita de estilo de texto não supervisionado, introduzindo duas perdas complementares à família de modelos generative adversarial network (GAN). Ao contrário das perdas concorrentes usadas em GANs, introduzimos perdas cooperativas onde o discriminador e o gerador cooperam e reduzem a mesma perda. A primeira é uma perda contrastiva e a segunda é uma perda de classificação --- visando regularizar ainda mais o espaço latente e aproximar sentenças semelhantes. Demonstramos que esse treinamento retém restrições lexicais, sintáticas e específicas de domínio entre domínios para vários conjuntos de dados de referência, incluindo aqueles em que mais de um atributo é alterado. Mostramos que as perdas cooperativas complementares melhoram a qualidade do texto, de acordo com medidas de avaliação automatizadas e humanas.', 'ja': '近年、ドメイン間でのテキストの自動転送が普及している。 その目的の1つは、ターゲットドメインに適応しながらセマンティックコンテンツを保存することです。 しかし、ソースと翻訳されたテキストとの間の他の属性（例えば、テキストの長さと記述性）を明示的に維持するものではありません。 転送の制約を維持するには、データ拡張やデビアシングを含むいくつかのダウンストリームアプリケーションがあります。  このような制約付き無監督テキストスタイル転送のための方法を、モデルの生成対抗ネットワーク（ ＧＡＮ ）ファミリーに２つの相補的損失を導入することによって紹介する。 GANで使用されている競合損失とは異なり、判別者と発電者が協力して同じ損失を減らす協力損失を導入しています。 1つ目は対照的な損失であり、2つ目は分類の損失です---潜在的な空間をさらに規則化し、同様の文をより近づけることを目的としています。 このようなトレーニングは、複数のベンチマークデータセット（複数の属性が変更されるものを含む）のドメイン間の語彙的、構文的、およびドメイン固有の制約を保持することを実証します。  相補的な協力的損失は、自動評価尺度と人間評価尺度の両方に従って、テキスト品質を改善することを示しています。', 'zh': '近者,域名间文本自传输流行起来。 其一在适应目标域者存语义。 然不明护源文译本之性,如文本长描述性。 传输中持约数下流,兼数增强去偏倚。  向生抗网络(GAN)系列引二互补损,引入一传输。 与 GAN 之竞争性异损,引入同损,其鉴别器与生成器合而损之。 一曰对比性损,二曰类失---旨在益规潜于空而密于句。 余证于数集,其练在数集(兼数集)域间存词法、句法、特定于域约束。  吾明以自与人工评事,互补合损可以崇文质。', 'hi': 'डोमेन के बीच पाठ का स्वचालित स्थानांतरण हाल के दिनों में लोकप्रिय हो गया है। इसके उद्देश्यों में से एक लक्ष्य डोमेन के अनुकूल होने के दौरान शब्दार्थ सामग्री को संरक्षित करना है। हालांकि, यह स्पष्ट रूप से स्रोत और अनुवादित पाठ के बीच अन्य विशेषताओं को बनाए नहीं रखता है: उदाहरण के लिए, पाठ की लंबाई और वर्णनात्मकता। हस्तांतरण में बाधाओं को बनाए रखने में डेटा वृद्धि और debiasing सहित कई डाउनस्ट्रीम अनुप्रयोग हैं।  हम मॉडल के जननात्मक प्रतिकूल नेटवर्क (GAN) परिवार के लिए दो पूरक नुकसान पेश करके इस तरह के विवश असुरक्षित पाठ शैली हस्तांतरण के लिए एक विधि पेश करते हैं। जीएएन में उपयोग किए जाने वाले प्रतिस्पर्धी नुकसान के विपरीत, हम सहकारी नुकसान पेश करते हैं जहां भेदभावकरने वाले और जनरेटर सहयोग करते हैं और एक ही नुकसान को कम करते हैं। पहला एक विरोधाभासी नुकसान है और दूसरा एक वर्गीकरण हानि है --- अव्यक्त स्थान को और नियमित करने और इसी तरह के वाक्यों को एक साथ लाने का लक्ष्य है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि इस तरह के प्रशिक्षण कई बेंचमार्क डेटासेट के लिए डोमेन के बीच लेक्सिकल, वाक्यात्मक और डोमेन-विशिष्ट बाधाओं को बरकरार रखते हैं, जिनमें वे भी शामिल हैं जहां एक से अधिक विशेषताएं बदलती हैं।  हम दिखाते हैं कि पूरक सहकारी नुकसान स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन दोनों उपायों के अनुसार पाठ की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Автоматическая передача текста между доменами стала популярной в последнее время. Одной из его целей является сохранение семантического контента при адаптации к целевому домену. Тем не менее, он явно не поддерживает другие атрибуты между исходным и переведенным текстом: например, длина текста и описательность. Поддержание ограничений в передаче имеет несколько последующих приложений, включая расширение и дебиализацию данных.  Введем метод такой ограниченной неконтролируемой передачи стиля текста путем введения двух взаимодополняющих потерь в семейство моделей генеративной состязательной сети (GAN). В отличие от конкурирующих потерь, используемых в GAN, мы вводим совместные потери, где дискриминант и генератор сотрудничают и уменьшают одни и те же потери. Первое - это контрастная потеря, а второе - потеря классификации, направленная на дальнейшую регуляризацию латентного пространства и сближение похожих предложений. Мы демонстрируем, что такое обучение сохраняет лексические, синтаксические и доменно-специфические ограничения между доменами для нескольких эталонных наборов данных, включая те, где изменяется более одного атрибута.  Мы показываем, что дополнительные кооперативные потери улучшают качество текста в соответствии с автоматизированными и человеческими оценочными мерами.', 'ga': 'Tá an-tóir ar aistriú uathoibríoch téacs idir fearainn le tamall anuas. Ar cheann dá aidhmeanna ná an t-ábhar séimeantach a chaomhnú agus é a oiriúnú don spriocfhearann. Mar sin féin, ní choinníonn sé tréithe eile go follasach idir an téacs foinseach agus an téacs aistrithe: m.sh., fad an téacs agus an tuairisciúlacht. Tá roinnt feidhmeanna iartheachtacha ag baint le srianta a choinneáil ar an aistriú, lena n-áirítear méadú sonraí agus díchlaonadh. Tugaimid isteach modh le haghaidh aistrithe srianta den sórt sin ar stíl téacs gan mhaoirseacht trí dhá chaillteanas chomhlántacha a thabhairt isteach do theaghlach samhlacha an líonra sáraíochta giniúna (GAN). Murab ionann agus na caillteanais iomaíocha a úsáidtear i GANanna, tugaimid isteach caillteanais chomhoibríocha ina n-oibríonn an t-idirdhealúoir agus an gineadóir le chéile agus laghdaítear an caillteanas céanna. Caillteanas codarsnachta atá sa chéad cheann agus is caillteanas aicmithe é an dara ceann --- a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige an spás folaigh a thabhairt chun rialtachta tuilleadh agus abairtí comhchosúla a thabhairt níos gaire dá chéile. Léirímid go gcoimeádann oiliúint den sórt sin srianta foclóireachta, comhréire agus fearainn-shonracha idir fearainn le haghaidh tacar sonraí tagarmhairc iolracha, lena n-áirítear cinn ina n-athraíonn níos mó ná tréith amháin. Léiríonn muid go bhfeabhsaíonn na caillteanais chomhoibríocha comhlántacha cáilíocht an téacs, de réir na mbeart meastóireachta uathoibrithe agus daonna araon.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη μεταφορά κειμένου μεταξύ τομέων έχει γίνει δημοφιλής τον τελευταίο καιρό. Ένας από τους στόχους της είναι η διατήρηση του σημασιολογικού περιεχομένου ενώ προσαρμόζεται στον τομέα προορισμού. Ωστόσο, δεν διατηρεί ρητά άλλα χαρακτηριστικά μεταξύ του αρχικού και του μεταφρασμένου κειμένου: π.χ. μήκος και περιγραφικότητα κειμένου. Η διατήρηση περιορισμών στη μεταφορά έχει αρκετές μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της αύξησης δεδομένων και της απομάκρυνσης. Εισάγουμε μια μέθοδο για μια τέτοια περιορισμένη, χωρίς επίβλεψη μεταφορά στυλ κειμένου εισάγοντας δύο συμπληρωματικές απώλειες στην οικογένεια μοντέλων γενεαλογικού αντιδιαστατικού δικτύου (GAN). Σε αντίθεση με τις ανταγωνιστικές ζημίες που χρησιμοποιούνται στα GAN, εισάγουμε συνεταιριστικές ζημίες όπου ο διακριτικός παράγοντας και η γεννήτρια συνεργάζονται και μειώνουν την ίδια ζημία. Η πρώτη είναι μια αντιφατική απώλεια και η δεύτερη είναι μια απώλεια ταξινόμησης --- με στόχο την περαιτέρω ρύθμιση του λανθάνοντος χώρου και την προσέγγιση παρόμοιων προτάσεων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι μια τέτοια εκπαίδευση διατηρεί λεξικούς, συντακτικούς και ειδικούς περιορισμούς μεταξύ τομέων για πολλαπλά σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς, συμπεριλαμβανομένων εκείνων όπου αλλάζουν περισσότερα από ένα χαρακτηριστικά. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι οι συμπληρωματικές συνεταιριστικές απώλειες βελτιώνουν την ποιότητα των κειμένων, τόσο σύμφωνα με αυτοματοποιημένα όσο και με ανθρώπινα μέτρα αξιολόγησης.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის ავტომატური გადატვირთვა დიომენების შორის პოლუმენტია ახალი დროში. ერთი მიზეზი არის სემონტიკური შემდგომარების შემდგომარება, როცა მიზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზი დიომინის შესახებ. მაგრამ, ის არ ექსპერიტურად ექსპერიტური ატრიბუტები ჩატვირთებს წიგნის და გარგულილი ტექსტის შორის: მაგალითად, ტექსტის სიგრძე და განახულ მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებელია მონაცემების შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ ასეთი შეცდომარებული ტექსტის სტილის გადატანისთვის მეტი გადავიყენებთ, რომელიც ორი კომპლენტური დაკავშირება მოდელების გენერაციური გარეგარიური ქსელის (GAN) ოჯახში. მაშინ, ჩვენ დავიყენებთ კომპენტირებული დასრულებების განმავლობაში, რომელიც დისკრიმინატორი და генერатоრი მუშაობენ და შემცირებენ იგივე დასრულება. პირველი არის კონტრასტიური დაკავშირება და მეორე არის კლასიფიკაციის დაკავშირება, რომელიც უნდა რეგრალურადოთ დაკავშირებული სივრცე და დაახლოებით მსგავსი სიტყვები. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ასეთი განსწავლება ლექსიკალური, სინტაქტიური და დიომინური განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრება დიომინების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ატრიბუტის ცვლილებ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კომპლენტერიური კომპერაციური დასრულება ტექსტის კაalitეტის უფრო მეტადება, რომელიც ადამიანის გაუმუშავება.', 'hu': 'A domainek közötti automatikus szövegátvitel az utóbbi időkben népszerűvé vált. Egyik célja a szemantikai tartalom megőrzése, miközben alkalmazkodik a céltartományhoz. Ugyanakkor kifejezetten nem tart fenn más attribútumokat a forrás és a lefordított szöveg között: például a szöveg hossza és leírása. Az átvitel korlátozásainak fenntartása számos downstream alkalmazással rendelkezik, beleértve az adatok bővítését és a debiasing-t. Az ilyen korlátozott, felügyelet nélküli szövegstílusátvitel módszerét vezetjük be azzal, hogy két kiegészítő veszteséget vezetünk be a generációs ellenfélhálózat (GAN) modellcsaládba. A GAN-okban használt versenytárs veszteségekkel ellentétben együttműködési veszteségeket vezetünk be, ahol a diszkrimináló és a generátor együttműködik és csökkentik ugyanazt a veszteséget. Az első egy kontrasztos veszteség, a második pedig egy osztályozási veszteség --- amelynek célja a látens tér további szabályozása és a hasonló mondatok közelebb hozása. Bemutatjuk, hogy az ilyen képzés megőrzi a lexikai, szintaktikai és tartományspecifikus korlátozásokat több referenciaadatkészlet között, beleértve azokat is, ahol több attribútum változik. Megmutatjuk, hogy a kiegészítő együttműködési veszteségek javítják a szövegminőséget mind automatizált, mind emberi értékelési intézkedések szerint.', 'kk': 'Домендер арасындағы мәтінді автоматты түрде аудару соңғы уақытта жалпы болды. Осы мақсаттардың бірі - мақсатты доменге адаптау кезінде семантикалық мазмұнын сақтау. Бірақ, ол көзі мен аударылған мәтін арасындағы басқа атрибуттарды таңдамайды: мысалы, мәтін ұзындығы мен түсініктемесі. Тасымалдағы шектеулерді сақтау бірнеше төмендету қолданбалары бар, деректерді көбейту және дебизациялау. Біз бұл шектелмеген мәтін стилінің аудару әдісін келтіреміз, үлгілердің құрамындағы қарсылық желіне (GAN) екі қосымша жоғалуын келтіреміз. ГАН-де қолданылатын сәйкесті жоғалулардың қасиеті, бұл жерде дискриминатор мен генератор сотрудничік көмектеседі және бір жоғалуды азайтады. Біріншісі - контрастық жоғалу және екіншісі - классификациялық жоғалу - - келесі бос орынды тегістеп, ұқсас сөздерді бірге жақындау үшін мақсатты. Біз бұл оқыту лексикалық, синтактикалық және доменге бірнеше банкмарк деректер қорларының арасындағы домендер арасындағы шектеулерді қалдырады деп көрсетіп тұрамыз. Біз қосымша кооперациялық жоғалулардың мәтін сапасын автоматты түрде және адамдардың оқу мерзіміне сәйкес жасайтынын көрсетедік.', 'it': "Il trasferimento automatico di testo tra domini è diventato popolare negli ultimi tempi. Uno dei suoi obiettivi è quello di preservare il contenuto semantico adattandosi al dominio di destinazione. Tuttavia, non mantiene esplicitamente altri attributi tra la fonte e il testo tradotto: ad esempio, lunghezza e descrittività del testo. Mantenere i vincoli nel trasferimento ha diverse applicazioni a valle, tra cui l'aumento dei dati e il debiasing. Introduciamo un metodo per questo trasferimento di stile testuale non supervisionato vincolato introducendo due perdite complementari alla famiglia di modelli della rete avversaria generativa (GAN). A differenza delle perdite concorrenti utilizzate nelle GAN, introduciamo perdite cooperative in cui il discriminatore e il generatore cooperano e riducono la stessa perdita. La prima è una perdita contrastante e la seconda è una perdita di classificazione --- che mira a regolarizzare ulteriormente lo spazio latente e avvicinare frasi simili tra loro. Dimostriamo che tale formazione mantiene vincoli lessicali, sintattici e specifici del dominio tra domini per più set di dati di benchmark, inclusi quelli in cui cambiano più attributi. Mostriamo che le perdite complementari cooperative migliorano la qualità del testo, secondo misure di valutazione automatizzate e umane.", 'lt': 'Automatinis teksto perdavimas tarp domenų pastaraisiais laikais tapo populiarus. Vienas iš jos tikslų – išsaugoti semantinį turinį ir prisitaikyti prie tikslinės srities. Tačiau jame aiškiai nenurodyti kiti požymiai tarp šaltinio ir vertimo teksto: pvz., teksto ilgis ir aprašymas. Perdavimo apribojimų išlaikymas apima keletą tolesnių programų, įskaitant duomenų didinimą ir debitavimą. Įdiegiame tokį ribotą nepastebimo teksto stiliaus perdavimo metodą, įvedant du papildomus nuostolius kartiniam prieštaringam tinklui (GAN) modelių šeimai. Unlike the competing losses used in GANs, we introduce cooperative losses where the discriminator and the generator cooperate and reduce the same loss.  The first is a contrastive loss and the second is a classification loss --- aiming to regularize the latent space further and bring similar sentences closer together.  Mes įrodome, kad toks mokymas išlaiko įvairių lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių, įskaitant tuos, kuriuose pasikeičia daugiau nei vienas požymis, srityse taikomus leksinius, sintaksinius ir konkrečiai sritims būdingus apribojimus. Mes parodome, kad papildomi kooperatyvų nuostoliai gerina teksto kokybę pagal automatizuotas ir žmogaus vertinimo priemones.', 'mk': 'Автоматски трансфер на текст меѓу домени стана популарен во последните времиња. Една од нејзините цели е да ја зачува семантичната содржина, прилагодувајќи се на доменот на целта. Сепак, истиот не одржува експлицитно други атрибути помеѓу изворот и преведениот текст: на пример, должината на текстот и описноста. Задржувањето на ограничувањата во трансферот има неколку понатамошни апликации, вклучително и зголемување на податоците и дебизација. Ние воведуваме метод за ваков ограничен ненадгледуван трансфер на текст стил со воведување на две комплементарни загуби на генеративната непријателска мрежа (ГАН) семејство на модели. За разлика од конкурентните загуби користени во ГАН, ние воведуваме соработувачки загуби каде дискриминаторот и генераторот соработуваат и ја намалуваат истата загуба. The first is a contrastive loss and the second is a classification loss --- aiming to regularize the latent space further and bring similar sentences closer together.  Демонстрираме дека ваквата обука задржува лексикални, синтактички и специфични ограничувања на домените меѓу домените за многуте компјутери на податоци, вклучително и оние каде повеќе од еден атрибут се менуваат. Ние покажуваме дека комплементарните загуби од соработката го подобруваат квалитетот на текстот, според и автоматизираните, и човечките мерки за проценка.', 'ms': 'Pemindahan teks automatik diantara domain telah menjadi populer pada masa-masa yang lalu. Salah satu tujuannya adalah untuk menyimpan kandungan semantik semasa menyesuaikan kepada domain sasaran. Namun, ia tidak secara eksplicit menyimpan atribut lain diantara sumber dan teks terjemahan: cth., panjang teks dan keterangan. Menjaga keterangan dalam pemindahan mempunyai beberapa aplikasi turun, termasuk peningkatan dan debiasing data. We introduce a method for such constrained unsupervised text style transfer by introducing two complementary losses to the generative adversarial network (GAN) family of models.  Tidak seperti kerugian berkompetisi yang digunakan dalam GAN, kami memperkenalkan kerugian kooperatif di mana diskriminator dan generator bekerja sama dan mengurangkan kerugian yang sama. Yang pertama adalah kehilangan bertentangan dan yang kedua adalah kehilangan klasifikasi -- bertujuan untuk mengatur ruang tersembunyi lebih jauh dan membawa kalimat yang serupa lebih dekat bersama-sama. Kami menunjukkan bahawa latihan tersebut menyimpan halangan leksikal, sintaktik dan domain-spesifik diantara domain untuk set data benchmark berbilang, termasuk yang mana lebih dari satu atribut berubah. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kerugian kerjasama tambahan meningkatkan kualiti teks, berdasarkan tindakan penilaian automatik dan manusia.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത സമയങ്ങളില്\u200d ഡൊമെനുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ പദാവലിയുടെ സ്വയം മാറ്റുന്നതാണ്. അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യമാണ് ലക്ഷ്യം ഡോമെയിനോട് മാറ്റുമ്പോള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ഉള്ളടക്കം സൂക്ഷി However, it does not explicitly maintain other attributes between the source and translated text: e.g., text length and descriptiveness.  മാറ്റുന്നതില്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഡാറ്റ്രീമിലെ പല പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുണ്ട്. ഡേറ്റാ കൂട്ടുന്നതിന ഇത്തരം തടസ്സപ്പെടാത്ത ടെക്സ്റ്റ് സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മോഡലുകളുടെ ജനററിവ് എതിര്\u200dവ്വ ജിയാനില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിരോധ നഷ്ടങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് തെറ്റില്ലാതെ നമ്മള്\u200d സഹകരിക്കുന്ന നഷ്ടങ്ങളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അവിടെ വി ആദ്യം ഒരു എതിര്\u200dപ്പുള്ള നഷ്ടത്തിലാണ്. രണ്ടാമത്തേത് ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d നഷ്ടത്തിലാണ്- അടുത്ത സ്ഥലം കൂടുതല്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക് ഇത്തരം ട്രെയിനിങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു പ്രതിഫലം മാറ്റിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രതിഫലത്തിന് കൂടുതല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d സഹകരിക്കുന്ന നഷ്ടങ്ങള്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ വ്യവസ്ഥയെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്', 'mt': 'It-trasferiment awtomatiku tat-test bejn id-dominji sar popolari f’dawn l-aħħar żminijiet. One of its aims is to preserve the semantic content while adapting to the target domain.  However, it does not explicitly maintain other attributes between the source and translated text: e.g., text length and descriptiveness.  Iż-żamma tar-restrizzjonijiet fit-trasferiment għandha bosta applikazzjonijiet downstream, inkluż żieda fid-dejta u tnaqqis fid-dejn. Aħna nintroduċu metodu għal tali trasferiment ta’ stil ta’ test mhux sorveljat ristrett billi nintroduċu żewġ telf kumplimentari għall-familja ta’ mudelli tan-netwerk avversarju ġenerattiv (GAN). Għall-kuntrarju tat-telf kompetittiv użat fil-GANs, aħna nintroduċu telf kooperattiv fejn id-diskriminatur u l-ġeneratur jikkooperaw u jnaqqsu l-istess telf. L-ewwel huwa telf kuntrastattiv u t-tieni huwa telf ta » klassifikazzjoni -- bil-għan li l-ispazju moħbi jiġi rregolarizzat aktar u s-sentenzi simili jinġiebu eqreb flimkien. Aħna nippruvaw li taħriġ bħal dan iżomm restrizzjonijiet lexiċi, sintetiċi u speċifiċi għad-dominji bejn id-dominji għal settijiet ta’ dejta b’parametri referenzjarji multipli, inklużi dawk fejn jinbidlu aktar minn attribut wieħed. Aħna nuru li t-telf kooperattiv kumplimentari jtejjeb il-kwalità tat-test, skont il-miżuri ta’ evalwazzjoni kemm awtomatizzati kif ukoll umani.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед хэсгүүдийн хоорондоо автоматжуулсан текст шилжүүлэх нь алдартай болсон. Түүний нэг зорилго нь зорилготой холбоонд зохион байгуулахдаа semantic content хадгалах юм. Гэхдээ үүнийг эх үүсвэр болон орчуулагдсан текст хоорондын өөр өөр харилцааныг тодорхой хадгалахгүй. Жишээ нь, текст урт болон тайлбарлалт. Тайлбарт хязгаарлах хязгаарлалтууд олон доорх хэрэглэмжүүд байдаг. Мэдээллийн нэмэлт болон дэвшүүлэх. Бид ийм хязгааргүй текст хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэлтийн арга загвар тайлбарлаж, загварын эсрэг сүлжээний (GAN) гэр бүл дээр хоёр нэмэлт алдагдлыг тайлбарлаж байна. ГАН-д ашиглаж байгаа өрсөлдөгч алдагдлыг ялгаад бид хамтран ажилладаг алдагдлыг харуулж, хуваарч, генератор хамтран ажиллаж, ижил алдагдлыг багасгаж байна. Эхлээд эсрэг алдагдал, хоёр дахь нь хуваалцааны алдагдал--- сүүлийн орон зайг дахин сайжруулах, төстэй өгүүлбэрүүдийг ойртуулах зорилго юм. Бид ийм сургалтын тухай хэлэлцээг, синтактик, холбооны хооронд олон салбарын өгөгдлийн сангуудын хоорондын хязгаарлалтыг хадгалдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид нэмэлт хамтрагч алдагдлыг харуулж байна. Текст чанарыг автоматжуулсан болон хүн төрөлхтний оюун шаардлагатай.', 'pl': 'Automatyczny transfer tekstu między domenami stał się popularny w ostatnich czasach. Jednym z jego celów jest zachowanie treści semantycznych przy jednoczesnym dostosowaniu się do domeny docelowej. Nie zachowuje ona jednak wyraźnie innych atrybutów między tekstem źródłowym a przetłumaczonym: np. długości i opisu tekstu. Utrzymywanie ograniczeń w transferze ma kilka dalszych aplikacji, w tym powiększanie danych i debiacing. Wprowadzamy metodę takiego ograniczonego bez nadzoru transferu stylu tekstu poprzez wprowadzenie dwóch uzupełniających się strat do rodziny modeli generatywnej sieci przeciwnej (GAN). W przeciwieństwie do strat konkurencyjnych stosowanych w GAN, wprowadzamy straty spółdzielcze, gdzie dyskryminator i generator współpracują i zmniejszają te same straty. Pierwsza jest stratą kontrastywną, a druga stratą klasyfikacji --- mającą na celu dalszą regulację utajonej przestrzeni i zbliżenie podobnych zdań do siebie. Pokazujemy, że takie szkolenie zachowuje ograniczenia leksykalne, składniowe i specyficzne dla domen dla wielu zestawów danych referencyjnych, w tym takie, w których zmienia się więcej niż jeden atrybut. Pokazujemy, że uzupełniające się straty spółdzielcze poprawiają jakość tekstu, zarówno w oparciu o zautomatyzowane, jak i ludzkie środki oceny.', 'no': 'Automatisk overføring av tekst mellom domene er blitt populært i nyleg tid. Ein av dei målane er å beholda semantiske innhaldet medan du tilpassar målgdomenet. Det gjer imidlertid ikkje eksplisisert andre attributtar mellom kjelden og omsetjingsteksten: f.eks. tekstlengde og beskrivelighet. Beholding av begrensningar i overføring har fleire nedstrekkprogram, inkludert data augmentasjon og debiasing. Vi introduserer ein metode for slike avgrensa tekststiloverføring ved å introdusera to komplementære tap til den genererte negativnettverket (GAN) familien av modeller. I motsetning til sammenhenga tap som brukar i GAN, introduserer vi samarbeidsflate tap der diskriminatoren og generatoren samarbeider og reduserer samme tap. Den første er ein kontrasttap, og den andre er ein tap av klassifikasjon -- målet å regulere latentet plass framover og gjera liknande setningar nærmere sammen. Vi viser at slike opplæring inneheld leksiske, syntaktiske og domenespesifikke begrensningar mellom domene for fleire benchmarkdatasett, inkludert dei der fleire enn eitt attributtendring. Vi viser at komplementære samarbeidsflate er forbetra tekstkvalitet, etter både automatiserte og menneskelige evalueringstiltak.', 'ro': 'Transferul automat de text între domenii a devenit popular în ultima vreme. Unul dintre obiectivele sale este păstrarea conținutului semantic adaptându-se la domeniul țintă. Cu toate acestea, nu menține în mod explicit alte atribute între sursă și textul tradus: de exemplu, lungimea și descriptivitatea textului. Menținerea constrângerilor în transfer are mai multe aplicații în aval, inclusiv mărirea datelor și debiasing. Introducem o metodă pentru un astfel de transfer de stil text nesupravegheat constrâns prin introducerea a două pierderi complementare familiei de modele generative adversarial network (GAN). Spre deosebire de pierderile concurente utilizate în GAN, introducem pierderi cooperative în cazul în care discriminatorul și generatorul cooperează și reduc aceeași pierdere. Prima este o pierdere contrastivă și a doua este o pierdere de clasificare --- având ca scop regularizarea spațiului latent mai departe și aducerea propozițiilor similare mai aproape. Demonstrăm că o astfel de instruire menține constrângeri lexicale, sintactice și specifice domeniilor între domenii pentru mai multe seturi de date de referință, inclusiv cele în care se schimbă mai multe atribute. Arătăm că pierderile cooperative complementare îmbunătățesc calitatea textului, atât conform măsurilor de evaluare automată, cât și umană.', 'sr': 'Automatski prijenos teksta između domena je u poslednje vreme postao popularan. Jedan od njegovih ciljeva je da sačuva semantički sadržaj dok se prilagodi ciljnoj domenu. Međutim, ne održava objašnjenje drugih atributa između izvora i prevedenog teksta: npr. dužina teksta i opisivnost. Održavanje ograničenja prijenosa ima nekoliko prijava, uključujući povećanje podataka i debijažu. Predstavljamo metodu za takav ograničeni neodređeni tekst stil uvođenjem dva komplementarnog gubitka generativnoj neprijateljskoj mreži (GAN) porodici modela. Za razliku od konkurentnih gubitka koje su koristili u GAN-u, predstavljamo saradnje gubitke gde diskriminacija i generator sarađuju i smanjuju isti gubitak. Prvi je kontrastni gubitak, a drugi je gubitak klasifikacije -- cilj regularizacije latentnog prostora dalje i približavanje sličnih rečenica. Pokazujemo da takva obuka zadrži leksičke, sintaktičke i domene specifične ograničenje između domena za višestruke bazne podatake, uključujući one gde se više od jedne promene atributa. Pokazujemo da komplementni gubitak saradnje poboljšava kvalitet teksta, prema automatskim i ljudskim mjerama procjene.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පාළුවේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය අතර ප්\u200dරමාණය අතර ප්\u200dරමාණය අතර වෙල ඒකේ ඉලක්කයෙන් එකක් තමයි ඉලක්ක ඩෝමේන්ට් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සුරක්ෂා කරන්න. නමුත්, ඒක විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් පරිවර්තනය සහ පරිවර්තනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ: උදාහරණය, පාළ ප්\u200dරවර්තනයේ සීමාවක් තියාගන්න තියෙන්නේ, දත්ත විශාලනය සහ විශාලනය තියෙන්නේ. අපි ඒ වගේ අවධානය නැති පාළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා  GAN වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි සහයෝජනයක් නැති වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනකය සහ ජීනේටර් සහයෝජනකය මුලින්ම තමයි ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක නැතිවෙලා තියෙන්නේ, දෙවෙන්ම තමයි වර්ගයක් නැතිවෙලා තියෙන්නේ --- අදහස් කරලා ති අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය ලෙක්සිකල්, සංකේතික හා ඩොමේන් අතර විශේෂ සීමාවක් තියෙනවා බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සේට්  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සම්පූර්ණ සහයෝජනය නැතිවෙන්නේ පාළුවේ කුණුවත් විශේෂය, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂය', 'so': 'Maalmaha ugu dhowaaday in macluumaad gaar ah laga soo wareejiyo qoraalka dhexdooda. Mid ka mid ah waxyaabihiisu waa in la ilaaliyo waxyaabaha isbedelka ah marka la isbedelo guriga goalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee si cad uma haysto tusaale ahaan dhaadheer qoraal ah iyo qoraal turjuman. Isku xiriirka wareejinta waxaa ku jira codsiyooyin badan oo hoose ka socda, kuwaas oo ku jira koritaanka data iyo cadaadinta. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab aan u baahnayn qaababka qoraalka ee aan la ilaalinayn, si aan u soo saarno laba khasaaro oo complex ah ee shabakadda caadi ah (GAN) qoyska modellada. Si ka duwan khasaaraha ku saabsan ee lagu isticmaalay GAN, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa khasaaraha iskaashatada, meesha ay takoorida iyo dhaqaalaha u wada shaqaystaan oo ay u fekeraan khasaaraha isku mid ah. Kii ugu horeysa waa khasaare ka gees ah, kan labaadna waa khasaare fasax --- waxaana la jeedaa in la xereeyo cirka ugu dambeeya oo la soo wada ururiyo hadal la mid ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in waxbarashada caynkaas ah ay ku haystaan xaduudaha caadiga ah, isku-soocidda iyo deegaanka oo gaar ah oo ay u dhexeeyaan danbiyada bangiyada kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah meesha ay wax ka badnaan isbedelka gaarka ah. We show that the complementary cooperative losses improve text quality, according to both automated and human evaluation measures.', 'sv': 'Automatisk överföring av text mellan domäner har blivit populär på senare tid. Ett av dess mål är att bevara det semantiska innehållet samtidigt som man anpassar sig till måldomänen. Den behåller dock inte uttryckligen andra attribut mellan källtexten och den översatta texten, t.ex. textens längd och deskriptivitet. Att upprätthålla begränsningar i överföringen har flera efterföljande applikationer, inklusive dataökning och debiasing. Vi introducerar en metod för en sådan begränsad oövervakad textstilsöverföring genom att införa två kompletterande förluster till generative adversarial network (GAN) familj av modeller. Till skillnad från konkurrerande förluster som används i GAN introducerar vi kooperativa förluster där diskrimineraren och generatorn samarbetar och minskar samma förlust. Den första är en kontrastiv förlust och den andra är en klassificeringsförlust --- som syftar till att reglera det latenta utrymmet ytterligare och föra liknande meningar närmare varandra. Vi visar att sådan utbildning behåller lexikala, syntaktiska och domänspecifika begränsningar mellan domäner för flera referensdatauppsättningar, inklusive sådana där mer än ett attribut ändras. Vi visar att de kompletterande samarbetsförlusterna förbättrar textkvaliteten, enligt både automatiserade och mänskliga utvärderingsåtgärder.', 'ta': 'அண்மையில் களங்களுக்கிடையே உரையை தானாகவே மாற்றுதல் சமீபத்தில் மகிழ்ச்சியாகி விட்டது. இலக்கு களத்திற்கு ஒப்பிடும் போது அரைப்புள்ளிகளை பாதுகாப்பதற்காக அதன் இலக்குகளில் ஒன்று. ஆனால், அது மூலத்திற்கும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பட்ட உரைக்கும் இடையே மற்ற பண்புகளை வெளிப்படையாக வைத்திருக்கவில்லை: உ. ம். உரை ந பரிமாற்றத்தில் உள்ள கட்டுப்பாடுகளைப் பாதுகாப்பாற்றுதல் பல தாழ்நீர்வெளி பயன்பாடுகள் உள்ளன, தரவு கூட்டுதல் மற் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத உரை பாணியை மாற்றுவதற்கான ஒரு முறையை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மாதிரிகளின் பொதுவான எதிர்ப்பிரி பிணையத்திற்கு  ஜிஎனான்களில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் தோல்விகளை வித்தியாசமாக, நாம் ஒரே இழப்பை குறைத்து விடுகிறோம். முதல் எதிர்பார்ப்பு இழப்பு மற்றும் இரண்டாவது வகுப்பு இழப்பு - சமீபத்தில் உள்ள இடத்தை மேலும் கட்டுப்படுத்தி அதே வாக்குகளை நெரு இத்தகைய பயிற்சியின் மேல் ஒரு குணங்கள் மாற்றத்திற்கு அதிகமாக இருக்கும் இடங்களுக்கு இடையே உள்ள வெட்டியல், ஒத்திசைவு, மற்றும் களம் குறி தானியங்கி மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பீடு முறைகளை பொருத்தி நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் நிரந்தரமான நஷ்டத்தை மேம்', 'ur': 'ڈومین کے درمیان متن کی آٹوٹی انتقال اخیر وقت میں محبوب ہوگئی ہے. اس کی ایک هدف یہ ہے کہ موقع ڈومین کے ساتھ سمantic content حفاظت کریں۔ However, it does not explicitly maintain other attributes between the source and translated text: e.g., text length and description. انتقال میں محدودیت حفاظت کرنے کے لئے بہت سی نیچے سیارے کاربرد ہیں، جیسے ڈیٹا افزایش اور دبیزانگ کے ساتھ۔ ہم اس طرح ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے جو اس طرح محدود نہیں ہوئی متکس استیل ٹرنسٹر کے ذریعہ دو اضافہ خسارہ کے ذریعہ نمڈلوں کی نسبت مخالف نیٹ ورک (GAN) کے خاندان کو پیش کریں۔ GAN میں استعمال ہونے والی خسارہ کے بغیر، ہم تعداد کے خسارہ کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جہاں تقسیم کرنے والا اور جناتور تعداد کرتا ہے اور اسی خسارہ کو کم کرتا ہے. پہلا ایک مخالف خسارہ ہے اور دوسرا ایک مخالف خسارہ ہے--- اس کے مطابق لٹینٹی جگہ دوسرے سے سیدھا کرنا اور اس کے مطابق مطابق مطابق جمع کرنا ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ تعلیم لکسیکل، سینٹکتیک اور ڈومین کے درمیان چند بینچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے لئے مختلف محدودیت رکھتا ہے، جس میں ایک سے زیادہ متغیر ہے۔ ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ تعداد کی تعداد کے خسارہ ٹیکسٹ کی کیفیت کو اچھا کر دیتے ہیں، اور انسان کی ارزیابی کے مطابق.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Buning biri maqsadi, qanday domenni oʻzgartirishda semantik tarkibini saqlash. @ info Vazifaning tarkibini himoyalash uchun bir nechta dasturlarda maʼlumot qoʻshish va deb aytib boʻladi. Biz bunday xavfsiz qilmagan matn uslub uzatish usulini ko'rsamiz modellarning generativ foydalanuvchi tarmoqni (GAN) qoidaga ikkita murakkablik yo'qotib qo'llanmagan. GAN'larda ishlatilgan rivojlanuvchilarga o'xshash bo'lgan narsalarni o'zgartirish va generator bir necha narsalarni kamaytirish uchun qo'llanmalar qo'llanmagan. Birinchi tashkilotli tap va ikkinchi darajalashtirish tapi - yangi boʻsh joy davomida boshqarish va bir xil so'zlarni birlashtirish uchun. Biz buni ko'pchilik benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibi davlatlari uchun leksikal, syntactik va domen tarkibi qanday tartiblar tartiblarini ko'plab qoladi. Bu yerda bir xizmatdan ortiq o'zgarishlar bor. Biz murakkablik qo'shimcha qo'llanmalar matn sifatini oshirish imkoniyatini ko'rsatamiz, avtomatik va odamning qiymatlarini bajarish imkoniyatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc chuyển văn bản giữa miền vừa trở nên phổ biến. Một trong những mục tiêu của nó là bảo vệ ngữ pháp trong khi thích nghi với mục tiêu. Tuy nhiên, nó không hiển thị các thuộc tính khác giữa nguồn và đoạn được dịch: ví dụ, độ dài và khả năng diễn tả. Việc duy trì hạn chế trong việc chuyển nhượng có nhiều ứng dụng xuôi dòng, bao gồm việc tăng dữ liệu và làm thiếu nợ. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp để chuyển dạng chữ không giám sát giới hạn bằng cách nhập hai lỗ khác nhau vào hệ thống các mô hình gây hấn (GAN). Không giống như các tổn thất cạnh tranh được dùng trong các giải đấu, chúng tôi tạo ra các thiệt hại hợp tác nơi người phân biệt và máy phát triển hợp tác và giảm mất mát tương tự. Thứ nhất là một sự mất mát tương đối và thứ hai là một lỗ phân loại. nhằm nhằm hiệu chỉnh lại khoảng cách tiềm ẩn và đưa những câu tương tự gần nhau hơn. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng huấn luyện này vẫn duy trì hạn chế ngôn ngữ, pháp thuật và miền-đặc biệt giữa mỗi miền cho nhiều bộ dữ liệu chuẩn, bao gồm những trường hợp có nhiều khả năng thay đổi. Chúng tôi cho thấy các tổn thất cộng tác cải thiện chất lượng văn bản, dựa theo các biện pháp tự động và đánh giá con người.', 'hr': 'U posljednje vrijeme se automatski prenos teksta između domena postao popularan. Jedan od njegovih ciljeva je sačuvati semantički sadržaj dok se prilagođava ciljnoj domenu. Međutim, to ne održava jasno druge atribute između izvora i prevedenog teksta: npr. dužina teksta i opisivnost. Održavanje ograničenja prijenosa ima nekoliko nužnih primjena, uključujući povećanje podataka i debijažu. Predstavljamo metodu za takvu ograničenu neodređenu prebacivanje tekstskog stila uvođenjem dva dodatnih gubitka generativnoj neprijateljskoj mreži (GAN) obitelji modela. Za razliku od konkurentnih gubitka korištenih u GAN-u, predstavljamo gubitke saradnje gdje diskriminacija i generator surađuju i smanjuju isti gubitak. Prvi je kontrastni gubitak, a drugi je gubitak klasifikacije -- cilj regularizacije latentnog prostora dalje i približavanje sličnih rečenica. Pokazujemo da takva obuka zadrži leksičke, sintaktičke i domene specifične ograničenje između domena za višestruke bazne podatake, uključujući one gdje se više od jedne promjene atributa. Pokazujemo da komplementni gubitak saradnje poboljšava kvalitet teksta, prema automatskim i ljudskim mjerama procjene.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното прехвърляне на текст между домейните стана популярно в последно време. Една от целите му е да запази семантичното съдържание, като същевременно се адаптира към целевия домейн. Въпреки това, тя не поддържа изрично други атрибути между източника и преведения текст: например дължина на текста и описателност. Поддържането на ограниченията при трансфера има няколко приложения надолу по веригата, включително увеличаване на данните и дебиазиране. Въвеждаме метод за такъв ограничен и ненадзорен трансфер на текстов стил чрез въвеждане на две допълващи се загуби в семейството модели на генеративна контразартна мрежа (ГАН). За разлика от конкурентните загуби, използвани в ГАН, ние въвеждаме загуби в сътрудничество, при които дискриминаторът и генераторът си сътрудничат и намаляват една и съща загуба. Първата е контрастна загуба, а втората е класификационна загуба - целяща да регулира латентното пространство допълнително и да сближи подобни изречения. Ние демонстрираме, че такова обучение запазва лексикални, синтактични и специфични за домейна ограничения между домейните за множество сравнителни набори от данни, включително такива, при които повече от един атрибут се променят. Показваме, че допълнителните загуби в кооперацията подобряват качеството на текста, както по автоматизирани, така и по човешки мерки за оценка.', 'nl': "Automatische overdracht van tekst tussen domeinen is de laatste tijd populair geworden. Een van de doelstellingen is om de semantische inhoud te behouden en zich aan te passen aan het doeldomein. Er worden echter niet expliciet andere kenmerken tussen de brontekst en de vertaalde tekst gehandhaafd: bijvoorbeeld tekstlengte en beschrijvingskracht. Het handhaven van beperkingen bij overdracht heeft verschillende downstream toepassingen, waaronder data augmentation en debiasing. We introduceren een methode voor zo'n beperkte niet-begeleide tekststijltransfer door twee complementaire verliezen in te voeren aan de generative adversarian network (GAN) familie van modellen. In tegenstelling tot de concurrerende verliezen die worden gebruikt in GAN's, introduceren we coöperatieve verliezen waarbij de discriminator en de generator samenwerken en hetzelfde verlies verminderen. De eerste is een contrastief verlies en de tweede is een classificatieverlies --- met als doel de latente ruimte verder te reguleren en vergelijkbare zinnen dichter bij elkaar te brengen. We tonen aan dat dergelijke training lexicale, syntactische en domeinspecifieke beperkingen tussen domeinen behoudt voor meerdere benchmarkdatasets, waaronder die waarbij meer dan één attribuut verandert. We tonen aan dat de complementaire coöperatieve verliezen de tekstkwaliteit verbeteren, zowel volgens geautomatiseerde als menselijke evaluatiemaatregelen.", 'da': "Automatisk overførsel af tekst mellem domæner er blevet populær i den seneste tid. Et af dets mål er at bevare det semantiske indhold samtidig med at tilpasse sig måldomænet. Den opretholder dog ikke eksplicit andre attributter mellem kilden og den oversatte tekst, f.eks. tekstlængde og deskriptivitet. Vedligeholdelse af begrænsninger i overførsel har flere downstream applikationer, herunder dataforøgelse og debiasing. Vi introducerer en metode til en sådan begrænset overførsel af tekststil uden opsyn ved at indføre to supplerende tab til generative adversarial network (GAN) familien af modeller. I modsætning til de konkurrerende tab, der anvendes i GAN'er, indfører vi kooperative tab, hvor forskelsbehandleren og generatoren samarbejder og reducerer det samme tab. Det første er et kontrastivt tab og det andet er et klassifikationstab --- der sigter mod at regulere det latente rum yderligere og bringe lignende sætninger tættere sammen. Vi demonstrerer, at en sådan træning fastholder leksikske, syntaktiske og domænespecifikke begrænsninger mellem domæner for flere benchmark datasæt, herunder dem, hvor mere end én attribut ændres. Vi viser, at de supplerende samarbejdstab forbedrer tekstkvaliteten i henhold til både automatiserede og menneskelige evalueringsforanstaltninger.", 'de': 'Die automatische Übertragung von Text zwischen Domains ist in letzter Zeit populär geworden. Eines seiner Ziele ist es, den semantischen Inhalt bei gleichzeitiger Anpassung an die Zieldomäne zu erhalten. Andere Attribute zwischen Quelltext und übersetztem Text werden jedoch nicht explizit beibehalten: z.B. Textlänge und Beschreibungsfähigkeit. Die Beibehaltung von Einschränkungen bei der Übertragung hat mehrere nachgelagerte Anwendungen, einschließlich Datenaufbau und Debiasing. Wir führen eine Methode für eine solche eingeschränkte unüberwachte Textstilübertragung ein, indem wir zwei komplementäre Verluste in die Modellfamilie generative adversarian network (GAN) einführen. Im Gegensatz zu den konkurrierenden Verlusten, die in GANs verwendet werden, führen wir kooperative Verluste ein, bei denen der Diskriminierer und der Generator zusammenarbeiten und den gleichen Verlust verringern. Der erste ist ein kontrastiver Verlust und der zweite ist ein Klassifizierungsverlust --- mit dem Ziel, den latenten Raum weiter zu regularisieren und ähnliche Sätze näher zusammenzubringen. Wir zeigen, dass dieses Training lexikalische, syntaktische und domänenspezifische Einschränkungen zwischen Domänen für mehrere Benchmark-Datensätze beibehält, einschließlich solcher, bei denen sich mehr als ein Attribut ändern. Wir zeigen, dass die komplementären kooperativen Verluste die Textqualität sowohl durch automatisierte als auch durch menschliche Auswertungsmaßnahmen verbessern.', 'id': 'Transfer otomatis teks diantara domain telah menjadi populer pada saat-saat terakhir. Salah satu tujuannya adalah untuk mempertahankan isi semantis sementara mengadaptasi ke domain target. Namun, tidak secara eksplisit mempertahankan atribut lain antara sumber dan teks terjemahan: contohnya, panjang teks dan deskripsi. Menjaga batas dalam transfer memiliki beberapa aplikasi turun, termasuk peningkatan dan debiasing data. Kami memperkenalkan metode untuk transfer gaya teks tak terkendali dengan memperkenalkan dua kerugian komplementari untuk keluarga model jaringan musuh generatif (GAN). Tidak seperti kerugian berkompetisi yang digunakan dalam GAN, kami memperkenalkan kerugian kooperatif di mana diskriminator dan generator bekerja sama dan mengurangi kerugian yang sama. Yang pertama adalah kehilangan kontras dan yang kedua adalah kehilangan klasifikasi -- bertujuan untuk mengatur ruang latent lebih jauh dan membawa kalimat yang sama lebih dekat bersama-sama. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pelatihan seperti itu memelihara batasan lexik, sintaksi dan domain-spesifik antara domain untuk beberapa set data benchmark, termasuk yang mana lebih dari satu atribut berubah. Kami menunjukkan bahwa kerugian kooperatif komplimentar meningkatkan kualitas teks, berdasarkan tindakan evaluasi otomatis dan manusia.', 'sw': 'Kuhamishwa kwa faragha ya maandishi kati ya maeneo yamekuwa maarufu katika nyakati za hivi karibuni. Moja ya malengo yake ni kulinda maudhui ya kimapenzi wakati wa kubadilishana na maeneo ya lengo. Hata hivyo, haijaweka wazi hoja nyingine kati ya vyanzo vya habari na kutafsiriwa maandishi: mfano, urefu wa maandishi na maelezo. Kuweka vizuizi katika uhamishaji kuna matumizi kadhaa ya mito ya chini, ikiwa ni pamoja na kuongezeka kwa takwimu na kuharibiwa. ) Tunaonyesha mbinu za usafirishaji wa simu za maandishi usiohifadhiwa kwa kuanzisha hasara mbili za mpito kwa familia ya mifano ya kijeshi ya upinzani (GAN). Tofauti na hasara za mashindano yanayotumiwa katika GAN, tunaonyesha hasara za ushirikiano ambapo ubaguzi na mtengenezaji wanashirikiana na kupunguza hasara hiyo. Ya kwanza ni hasara ya kinyume na ya pili ni hasara ya kutangaza --- lengo la kudhibiti nafasi ya hivi karibuni zaidi na kuleta hukumu kama hizo karibu. Tunaonyesha kuwa mafunzo haya yanabakia vizuizi maalum vya kisaikolojia, ushirikiano na ndani kati ya maeneo kwa takwimu mbalimbali za bendera, ikiwa ni pamoja na zile ambazo zaidi ya mtazamo mmoja hubadilika. ) Tunaonyesha kwamba hasara za ushirikiano wa pamoja zinazobadilisha kiwango cha maandishi, kwa mujibu wa hatua za kutathmini binadamu za kibinadamu.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안, 지역 간에 자동으로 텍스트를 전송하는 것이 매우 유행하게 되었다.그 목적 중 하나는 목표역에 적응하는 동시에 의미 내용을 보존하는 것이다.그러나 원본 텍스트와 번역 텍스트 사이의 다른 속성, 예를 들어 텍스트 길이와 묘사성을 명확하게 유지하지 못했다.전송 중 유지보수 제약에는 데이터 확장과 차용을 포함한 몇 가지 하류 응용이 있다.생성적 대항 네트워크(GAN) 모델족에 두 가지 상호보완 손실을 도입함으로써 우리는 이러한 제한된 무감독 텍스트 스타일 전환에 사용되는 방법을 소개했다.GANs에서 사용되는 경쟁 손실과 달리 우리는 합작 손실을 도입했는데 그 중에서 감별기와 발생기가 합작하여 같은 손실을 줄였다.첫 번째는 손실을 비교하는 것이고 두 번째는 손실을 분류하는 것이다. 목적은 잠재적인 공간을 더욱 규범화하고 비슷한 문장을 더욱 긴밀하게 연결시키는 것이다.우리는 여러 개의 기준 데이터 집합, 여러 개의 속성이 변화하는 데이터 집합을 포함하는데 이런 훈련은 역 사이에 어휘, 문법과 특정한 역의 제약을 보존하고 있음을 증명했다.우리는 자동화와 인공 평가 조치에 따라 상호 보완적인 협력 손실이 텍스트의 질을 향상시켰다고 밝혔다.', 'fa': 'انتقال متن خودکار بین دامنه\u200cها در اخیراً محبوب شده است. یکی از هدف\u200cهایش اینه که محتوای semantic را در حالی که به دامنی هدف adapt می\u200cکند حفظ کنید. با این حال، این خصوصیت های دیگری بین منبع و متن ترجمه را نگه نمی دارد: مثلاً طول متن و توضیح متن. نگه داشتن محدودیت در انتقال چندین کاربرد پایین پایین دارد، شامل افزایش داده\u200cها و تغییر داده\u200cها. ما یک روش برای انتقال سبک متن محدود غیرقابل قابل قابل قابل قابل توصیف قرار می دهیم با توصیف دو خسارت اضافه به خانواده\u200cی شبک دشمنی (GAN) از مدل\u200cها را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. برخلاف خسارت مسابقه\u200cای که در GAN استفاده می\u200cشود، خسارت\u200cهای همکاری را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، جایی که اختلاف\u200cکننده و ژنراتور همکاری می\u200cکنند و همان خسارت را کاهش می\u200cدهند. اولین یک خسارت متفاوتی است و دومین یک خسارت محرمانه است که هدف آن است که فضای latent را بیشتر مستقیم سازی کند و جمله\u200cهای مشابه را به هم نزدیک سازید. ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که این تمرین محدودیت\u200cهای زبان، سنتاکتیک و دامنه\u200cهای خاص بین دامنه\u200cها برای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متعدد صفحه، شامل آن\u200cها که بیشتر از یک تغییر ویژه\u200cای دارد. ما نشان می دهیم که از دست دادن همکاری اضافی کیفیت متن، بر اساس اندازه\u200cهای ارزیابی خودکار و انسان، بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'sq': 'Transferimi automatik i tekstit midis domeneve është bërë popullor në kohët e fundit. Një nga qëllimet e tij është të ruajë përmbajtjen semantike duke u përshtatur në domenin e objektivit. Megjithatë, ajo nuk mban shprehësisht atribute të tjera midis burimit dhe tekstit të përkthyer: për shembull gjatësia e tekstit dhe përshkrimi. Mbajtja e kufizimeve në transferim ka disa aplikacione në vazhdim, duke përfshirë rritjen e të dhënave dhe dobësimin. Ne futim një metodë për një transferim të tillë të kufizuar të stilit të tekstit pa mbikqyrje duke futur dy humbje komplementare në familjen e modeleve të rrjetit kundërshtar gjenerativ (GAN). Në ndryshim nga humbjet konkurruese të përdorura në GAN, ne futim humbje kooperative ku diskriminuesi dhe gjeneratori bashkëpunojnë dhe reduktojnë të njëjtën humbje. E para është një humbje kontraste dhe e dyta është një humbje klasifikimi -- që synon të rregullojë hapësirën e fshehtë më tej dhe të sjellë fjalime të ngjashme më pranë njëri-tjetrit. Ne demonstrojmë se një trajnim i tillë mban kufizime lexike, sintaktike dhe specifike për domeni midis domeneve për grupe të dhënash të shumëfishta, duke përfshirë ato ku ndryshojnë më shumë se një atributë. Ne tregojmë se humbjet komplementare kooperative përmirësojnë cilësinë e tekstit, sipas masave të automatizuara dhe të vlerësimit njerëzor.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ጊዜ የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል በዶሜን መካከል በመጠቀም የተጠቃሚ ሆኖአል፡፡ አንዱ ጉዳዩ የእርሱን አካባቢ ዶሜን ለመጠበቅ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በመግለጫ እና በተወሰነ ጽሑፍ መካከል ሌሎችን ምርጫዎች በግልጽ አያስቀምጥም፤ ምሳሌ ጽሑፍ ርዝመት እና መግለጫ በመንቀሳቀስ ላይ ግንኙነት በመጠበቅ፣ ከዳታ ማጠቃለያ እና አዲስ ማስታወቂያው ጋር ብዙ ውኃ ፕሮግራሞች አሉ፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉትን ያልጠበቀው የጽሑፍ ዘይት ስልክ ማቀናቀል እናሳውቃለን፤ ሁለት ተጨማሪ ክፍተቶችን ወደ አዲስ ተቃዋሚ መረብ (GAN) የሞዴል ቤተሰቦችን በመግለጽ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በGAN ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙትን ተቃውሞ እና አዲስ እና አዲስ ተሳካሚ እና ያንን ጉዳት ያጎድልበታል፡፡ መጀመሪያው ተቃዋሚ ጉዳት ነው ሁለተኛውም መፍጠር ጉዳይ ነው - የኋለኛይቱን ቦታ እየተሻለ እና የመሰብሰብ ቃላት እንዲያቃጥል ነው፡፡ ይህ ትምህርት በአንድ ላይ የሚለወጥ አካባቢ ማህበረሰብ ማሰናከል እና በዲሞኖቹ መካከል ለሌክሲካዊ፣ Syntactic እና ዶሜን ግንኙነት እንዲያቆይ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በአካባቢው እና በሰው ማስታወቂያ ሥርዓት ብዛት የጽሑፍን ብዛት እንዲያበዛ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Outomatiese oordrag van teks tussen domeine word populaar in onlangse tyde. Een van sy doel is om die semantiese inhoud te bewaar terwyl aan die doel domein aanpas. Maar dit doen nie uitduidelik onderhou ander eienskappe tussen die bron en vertaalde teks nie: bv. teks lengte en beskrywing. Onderhou beheinings in oordrag het verskeie onderstreem toepassings, insluitend data augmentasie en debiasing. Ons introduseer 'n metode vir sodanige beperkte ongeondersteunde teks styl oordrag deur twee komplementare verlies te introduseer na die genereerde teëstandaar netwerk (GAN) familie van modele. Ongelyks van die mededingsverlore wat in GAN gebruik word, introduseer ons kooperatiewe verlore waar die diskrimineerder en die genereerder saamstig en die selfde verlore verduur. Die eerste is 'n kontrastiewe verlies en die tweede is 'n klassifikasie verlies --- die doel om die latente spasie verder te regulaliseer en gelykende setings nader saam te bring. Ons wys dat sodanige onderwerp lexiese, sintaktika en domein-spesifieke beheinings tussen domeine vir veelvuldige benchmarkdatastel hou, insluitend een waar meer as een eienskappe verander. Ons wys dat die komplementare kooperatiewe verlore teks kwaliteit verbeter, volgens beide outomatiese en menslike evalueringsmaat.", 'tr': "Öňki wagtlar arasynda metin arasynyň otomatik geçişi meşhur boldy. Onuň amaçlarynyň biri şu maksada domenya üýtgetmek üçin semantik maksadyny goramak. Ýöne, bu çe şme we terjime metin arasynda başga atributleri saýlamaýar: myselm, metin ululykyny we tassyklalykyny. Transfer sahypalaryny gaýd etmek üçin birnäçe aşak programler bar, maglumat ýetişdirmesi we Debiasing dahil. Biz bu ýagdaýda mätçileýän metin biçimlerini daýratyp, nusgala şebeke (GAN) maşgalasyna iki täpli ýitir goşulýar. GAN'da ýakynlaşyk kaynaklaryň ýagdaýynda, diskriminatör we jeneratör aynı kaynaklaryny azaltmak üçin işbirliği ýitirdik. İlk olarak kontrastlik kaybıdır ve ikincisi de klasifikasyon kaybıdır --- geçmiş alanı daha da düzenlemek ve benzer sözleri daha yaklaştırmak amacıdır. Biz bu şekilde okuwçylyk bir ýerden köp atribut üýtgedilişi sahypalaryň arasynda lektik, syntaktik we domenyň spesifik eserleri taýýarlandygyny görkeýäris. Biz özümize özümize we adamlaryň deňleşen ölçülerine görä, täzelikli işbirliğiň ýitildikleriniň metin howpsalyny geliştirmegini görkeýäris.", 'hy': "Վերջին ժամանակներում տեքստի ավտոմատ փոխանցումը դառնում է հայտնի: Նրա նպատակներից մեկն այն է, որ պահպանվի սեմանտիկ պարունակությունը, միաժամանակ հարմարվելով նպատակային բնագավառին: Այնուամենայնիվ, այն բացատրականորեն չի պահպանում աղբյուրի և թարգմանված տեքստի միջև այլ առանձնահատկություններ, օրինակ, տեքստի երկարությունը և նկարագրականությունը: Գործման սահմանափակումների պահպանումը ունի մի քանի հետագա ծրագրեր, ներառյալ տվյալների աճը և ձախողումը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այնպիսի սահմանափակ, անվերահսկված տեքստի ոճի փոխանցման մեթոդ' ներկայացնելով երկու համալրացող կորստ մոդելների սերունդային հակառակյալ ցանցի (ԳԱN) ընտանիքին: Ի տարբերություն ԳԱՆ-ում օգտագործվող մրցակցության կորստներին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք համագործակցության կորստներ, որտեղ խտրականությունը և գեներատորը համագործակցում են և նվազեցնում նույն կորստը: Առաջինը հակադրական կորուստ է, երկրորդը դասակարգման կորուստ է, որի նպատակով է ավելի լավ վերահսկել թաքնված տարածքը և մոտեցնել նման նախադասությունները: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այդպիսի ուսումնասիրությունը պահպանում է լեքսիկական, սինտակտիկ և տիեզերական սահմանափակումներ բազմաթիվ համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի միջև, ներառյալ այն համակարգերի, որոնց մեծ մասը փոխվում է: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ համագործակցական կորուստները բարելավում են տեքստի որակը, ըստ ինչպես ավտոմատիկ, ինչպես նաև մարդկային գնահատման միջոցների:", 'az': 'Son zamanlarda məktub arasındakı mətn avtomatik daşıması məşğul oldu. Onun məqsədilərindən biri məqsədilə uyğunlaşarkən semantik məlumatı qorumaq. Lakin, bu mənbənin və çevirilmiş mətnin arasında başqa xüsusiyyətləri açıq-aydın qorumaz: mətn uzunluğu və təfsirlik. Transferdə müəyyənləşdirilmək müəyyənləşdirilməsi üçün bir neçə aşağı proqramlar var, məlumat artırması və debiasing də dahil. Biz böyük müəyyən edilməmiş mətn stili transfer üçün bir metodu təşkil edirik ki, modellərin generiqli düşmənçi şəklə (GAN) ailəsinə iki əlavə çıxmışdır. GANlarda istifadə edilən münafiqlər kimi, münafiqlər və generator istifadə edir və istifadə edir. İlk dəyişiklik ziyan və ikinci dəyişiklik ziyanətidir -- latent alanı daha da düzəltmək və bənzər sözləri daha yaxınlaşdırmaq niyyətində. Biz göstəririk ki, bu təcrübə çoxlu benchmark veri quruları arasında leksik, sintaktik və domena müəyyən müddətlər saxlanır, bir attributdan daha çox dəyişiklik edənlər də dahil olacaqlar. Biz göstəririk ki, komplemental kooperativ ziyarətlərin məktub kalitetini, həmçinin automatik və insan değerlendirməsi ölçülərinə görə daha yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bs': 'Automatski prebacivanje teksta između domena u zadnje vrijeme postalo je popularan. Jedan od njegovih ciljeva je čuvati semantički sadržaj dok se prilagođava ciljnoj domenu. Međutim, ona ne održava jasno druge atribute između izvora i prevedenog teksta: na primjer, dužina teksta i opisivnost. Održavanje ograničenja prijenosa ima nekoliko prijava, uključujući povećanje podataka i debijažu. Predstavljamo metodu za takvu ograničenu neodređenu prebacivanje tekstskog stila uvođenjem dva dodatnih gubitka generativnoj neprijateljskoj mreži (GAN) porodici modela. Za razliku od konkurentnih gubitka korištenih u GAN-u, predstavljamo saradnje gubitke gdje diskriminacija i generator sarađuju i smanjuju isti gubitak. Prvi je kontrastni gubitak, a drugi je gubitak klasifikacije -- cilj regularizacije latentnog prostora dalje i približavanje sličnih rečenica. Pokazujemo da takva obuka zadrži leksičke, sintaktičke i domene specifične ograničenje između domena za višestruke bazne podatake, uključujući one gdje se više od jedne promjene atributa. Pokazujemo da komplementni gubitak saradnje poboljšava kvalitet teksta, prema automatskim i ljudskim mjerama procjene.', 'ca': "La transfer ència automàtica de text entre dominis ha esdevingut popular en els últims temps. Un dels seus objectius és preservar el contingut semàntic adaptant-se al domini d'objectiu. No obstant això, no manté explícitament altres atributs entre la font i el text traduit: per exemple, la llargada del text i la descriptivitat. Maintaining constraints in transfer has several downstream applications, including data augmentation and debiasing.   Introduïm un mètode per a una transfer ència d'estil de text no supervisada tan restringida introduint dues pèrdues complementars a la família de models de la xarxa adversaria generativa (GAN). A diferència de les pèrdues concurrents utilitzades en GAN, introduïm pèrdues cooperatives on el discriminator i el generador cooperen i redueixen la mateixa pèrdua. La primera és una pèrdua contrastiva i la segona és una pèrdua de classificació -- mirant a regularizar l'espai latent més endavant i apropar frases similars. Demonstrem que aquest entrenament manté restriccions lècsiques, sinàctiques i específices per domini entre dominis per a múltiples conjunts de dades de referència, incloent aquelles on canvia més d'un atributs. Mostrem que les pèrdues cooperatives complementars milloren la qualitat dels textos, d'acord amb mesures d'evaluació tant automatitzades com humanes.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক সময়ে ডোমেনের মধ্যে টেক্সট পরিবর্তনের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে জনপ্রিয় হয়ে গেছে। লক্ষ্য ডোমেইনের সাথে মিলিত হওয়ার সময় সেমেন্টিক বিষয়বস্তু সংরক্ষণ করার উদ্দেশ্যে একটি উদ্দেশ্য। তবে সোর্স এবং অনুবাদ করা টেক্সটের মধ্যে অন্যান্য বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য স্পষ্ট রাখে না: উদাহরণস্বরূপ লেখা দীর্ঘ এব ট্রান্সফারে নিষেধাজ্ঞা সংরক্ষণ করার বেশ কয়েকটি অ্যাপ্লিকেশন রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে ডাটা যোগাযোগ এবং বিভ্রান্তিকর এই ধরনের সংরক্ষিত টেক্সট স্টাইল পরিবর্তনের জন্য আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি চিহ্নিত করেছি যা তৈরি করা হয়েছে তার মাধ্যমে জেনারেটিভ বিরোধী নেটওয়ার্ক (জিএনএ জিয়ানে ব্যবহার করা প্রতিযোগিতার ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত, আমরা সহযোগিতায় ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হয়েছি যেখানে বৈষম্য এবং জেনারেটর একই ক্ষতি কমিয়ে দেয়। প্রথমটি একটি বিরোধী ক্ষতি এবং দ্বিতীয় ক্লাসাফেশনের ক্ষতি- এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সাম্প্রতিক জায়গাকে আরো নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা এবং একই ধরনের শা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই প্রশিক্ষণ বেশ কিছু বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের জন্য ডোমেনের মধ্যে লেক্সিক, সিন্ট্যাক্টিক এবং ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট নি আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সহযোগিতার ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ক্ষতিগুলো টেক্সটের মান উন্নতি করে, স্বয়ংক্রিয় এবং মানুষের মূল্যায়নে', 'cs': 'Automatický přenos textu mezi doménami se v poslední době stal populární. Jedním z jeho cílů je zachování sémantického obsahu při přizpůsobení se cílové doméně. Nicméně výslovně neudržuje jiné atributy mezi zdrojovým a přeloženým textem: např. délka a popisnost textu. Udržování omezení při přenosu má několik navazujících aplikací, včetně rozšíření dat a debiacing. Představujeme metodu takového omezeného přenosu textových stylů bez dohledu zavedením dvou komplementárních ztrát do rodiny modelů generativní nepřátelské sítě (GAN). Na rozdíl od konkurenčních ztrát používaných v GAN zavádíme družstevní ztráty, kdy diskriminační činitel a generátor spolupracují a snižují stejnou ztrátu. První je kontrastivní ztráta a druhá ztráta klasifikace --- jejímž cílem je dále regulovat latentní prostor a sblížit podobné věty. Ukazujeme, že takové školení zachovává lexikální, syntaktická a doménově specifická omezení mezi doménami pro více referenčních datových sad, včetně těch, kde se mění více než jeden atribut. Ukazujeme, že doplňkové ztráty ve spolupráci zlepšují kvalitu textu, a to jak na základě automatizovaných, tak lidských hodnotících opatření.', 'et': 'Automaatne teksti edastamine domeenide vahel on viimasel ajal muutunud populaarseks. Üheks selle eesmärgiks on säilitada semantiline sisu, kohandades samal ajal sihtdomeeniga. Siiski ei säilita see selgesõnaliselt muid atribuute allika ja tõlgitud teksti vahel: nt teksti pikkus ja kirjeldavus. Piirangute säilitamisel edastamisel on mitu järgmise etapi rakendust, sealhulgas andmete suurendamist ja debialiseerimist. Tutvustame sellise piiratud järelevalveta tekstistiilide edastamise meetodi, tuues sisse kaks täiendavat kahju generatiivse vastastikuse võrgu (GAN) mudelite perekonnale. Erinevalt GAN-is kasutatavatest konkureerivatest kahjudest võtame kasutusele ühistu kahjud, mille puhul diskrimineerija ja tootja teevad koostööd ja vähendavad sama kahju. Esimene on kontrastne kaotus ja teine klassifitseerimiskaotus -- mille eesmärk on varjatud ruumi veelgi reguleerida ja sarnaseid lauseid lähendada. Näitame, et selline koolitus säilitab mitme võrdlusandmekogumi jaoks domeenide vahelised leksikaalsed, süntaktilised ja domeenipõhised piirangud, sealhulgas need, kus muutuvad rohkem kui üks atribuut. Näitame, et täiendavad koostöökahjud parandavad teksti kvaliteeti nii automatiseeritud kui ka inimlike hindamismeetmete abil.', 'fi': 'Tekstin automaattinen siirto verkkotunnusten välillä on tullut suosittu viime aikoina. Yksi sen tavoitteista on säilyttää semanttinen sisältö ja sopeutua kohdealueeseen. Siinä ei kuitenkaan nimenomaisesti säilytetä muita määritteitä lähdetekstin ja käännetyn tekstin välillä: esimerkiksi tekstin pituus ja kuvailtavuus. Siirtoon liittyvien rajoitusten ylläpitäminen sisältää useita jatko-vaiheen sovelluksia, mukaan lukien tietojen lisääminen ja debiasointi. Esittelemme menetelmän tällaiseen rajattuun ja valvomattomaan tekstityylin siirtoon ottamalla käyttöön kaksi toisiaan täydentävää häviötä generatiiviseen kontradiktoriverkostoon (GAN). Toisin kuin GAN-järjestelmissä käytettävät kilpailevat tappiot, otamme käyttöön osuuskunnan tappiot, joissa syrjijä ja tuottaja tekevät yhteistyötä ja vähentävät samoja tappioita. Ensimmäinen on kontrastiivinen häviö ja toinen luokitushäviö -- tavoitteena on säännöstellä piilevää tilaa edelleen ja lähentää samankaltaisia lauseita toisiinsa. Osoitamme, että tällaisessa koulutuksessa säilytetään sanastolliset, syntaktiset ja toimialueekohtaiset rajoitukset useiden vertailutietoaineistojen välillä, mukaan lukien ne, joissa useampi kuin yksi attribuutti muuttuu. Osoitamme, että täydentävät yhteistyötappiot parantavat tekstin laatua sekä automatisoitujen että inhimillisten arviointitoimenpiteiden mukaisesti.', 'ha': "Motsa na matsayin farat ɗaya a tsakanin jama'a cikin kwanan da suka sani. Bayani da amfani da shi yana tsari tsarin maɓallin ƙarami da ake daidaita da wanda aka yi amfani da shi. Amma, bã ya tsare wasu halin bayani tsakanin source da aka fassar matsayin: misali, tsawo na matsayi da descriptin. @ action: button Tuna introduce wata shiri wa shige misãlan matsayin da aka tsare shi ba da tsare ta ba, kuma Mu introduce hasara biyu masu ƙaranci zuwa jerin motsi na ƙiyayya (GAN) jama'ar misãlai. Tofaun hasara da za'a yi amfani da GAN, za'a ƙara hasara mai tãrayya a wurin da mai tsakanin da mai gaura na samar da kuma ma'abũcin ya ƙara hasara guda. The first is a contrastive loss and the second is a classification loss --- aiming to regularize the latent space further and bring similar sentences closer together.  Tuna nũna wa wannan shirin ya tsare tsarin mutane na laƙaitacce, syntactic da ke cikin guda masu buƙata a tsakanin danne-danne-bayani masu yawa, da waɗanda ke ƙara canza halin ɗaya. Tuna nũna cewa hasara da ke ƙara tsakanin mutane sun improve tsarin matsayin, daidai ta ƙaddara da kiman.", 'sk': 'Samodejni prenos besedila med domenami je v zadnjem času postal priljubljen. Eden od njegovih ciljev je ohraniti semantično vsebino ob prilagajanju ciljni domeni. Vendar pa ne ohranja izrecno drugih atributov med izvornim in prevedenim besedilom: npr. dolžina besedila in opisnost. Ohranjanje omejitev pri prenosu ima več nadaljnjih aplikacij, vključno s povečanjem podatkov in obremenitvijo podatkov. Z uvedbo dveh dopolnilnih izgub v družino modelov generativnega kontradicionalnega omrežja (GAN) smo uvedli metodo za takšen omejen prenos besedilnega sloga brez nadzora. Za razliko od konkurenčnih izgub, ki se uporabljajo v GAN-ih, uvajamo izgube v zadrugi, kjer diskriminator in generator sodelujeta in zmanjšujeta isto izgubo. Prva je kontrastna izguba, druga pa klasifikacijska izguba -- katere cilj je dodatno urediti latentni prostor in približati podobne stavke. Pokazali smo, da takšno usposabljanje ohranja leksikalne, sintaktične in domensko specifične omejitve med domenami za več referenčnih naborov podatkov, vključno s tistimi, kjer se spremeni več atributov. Dokazujemo, da komplementarne izgube sodelovanja izboljšujejo kakovost besedila, tako v skladu z avtomatiziranimi kot človeškimi ukrepi ocenjevanja.', 'he': 'העברה אוטומטית של טקסט בין שדות הפכה פופולרית בזמנים האחרונים. אחת המטרות שלה היא לשמור על התוכן הסמנטי בזמן להתאים לתחום המטרה. בכל אופן, הוא לא שומר באופן ברור תכונות אחרות בין המקור לטקסט התרגם: למשל, אורך הטקסט ותיאור. לשמור על מחסומים בהעברה יש כמה שימושים למטה, כולל גידול נתונים וחמישה. אנחנו מציגים שיטה עבור העברת סגנון טקסט לא מוגבלת כזו על ידי הכניסה שני אבדות תוספות למשפחת דוגמנים של רשת היריבים הדורתית (GAN). Unlike the competing losses used in GANs, we introduce cooperative losses where the discriminator and the generator cooperate and reduce the same loss.  הראשון הוא אובדן נגד השני הוא אובדן מסווג -- המטרה לקבוע את המרחב הסתור יותר ויביא משפטים דומים קרובים יותר ביחד. אנחנו מראים שאימונים כאלה שומרים על מחסומים לקסיים, סינטקטיים ומספציפיים לתחום בין התחומים למספר קומות נתונים של רמזים רבים, כולל אלה שבו יותר מאחד מהתכונות משתנים. אנחנו מראים שהאובדנים המשותפים משתפרים את איכות הטקסט, על פי אמצעי הערכה אוטומטיים וגם אנושיים.', 'jv': 'domain One of their goal is to save the semanti Contents when Adjusting to the goal domain. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Jejaring Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing dibutuhke perusahaan seneng dadi wis nguasai nggawe ngubah iki perusahaan sing wis dianggapkno karo perusahaan seneng dolanan karo model Sing cah luwih dumadhi sing paling gambar nggawe Gambar, kita ngomong nik nggawe perusahaan negoro perusahaan winih sing bakal terus tambah karo perusahaan pangan sing beraksi iki bakal terus nyimpen Awak dhéwé sing perusahaan karbot akeh dumadhi lan saiki wis dipun-perusahaan karo kategori --- kuwi mau njaluké awak dhéwé sing luwih apik lan tambah pentar luwih apik dhéwé. We show that this tutorial sits lectucal, metadata and domain-special Awak dhéwé éntukno ngono-nglanggar sing luwih operasi tambah-luwih pisan seneng pisan, sing uwis seneng pisan seneng pisan bantuan ngono nggawe gerakan', 'bo': 'གནས་ཁོངས་དབར་གྱི་ཡིག་གི་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་དག་ནི་དུས་རམས་སྐབས་ཆ་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པ One of its aims is to preserve the semantic content while adapting to the target domain. ཡིན་ནའང་། འདིས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་དང་ཡིག Maintaining constraints in transfer have several downstream applications, including data augmentation and debiasing. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཚབ་ཀྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་བྱས་ནས་ཕར་བསྡུར་བརྗོད་བྱས་པ་གཉིས་མཉམ་ད དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་GANs ནང་སྤྱོད་པའི་མཐའ་འཁོར་ཉེན་དང་མི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་དགོས་མཁན་ཚོར་བརྗོད་ན། འུ་ཚོས་ཁྱབ་རྒྱ་ཆེན་བྱེད་ དང་པོ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། གཉིས་པ་དེ་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་གི་བསམ་བློ་བར་གནས་སྟངས་ཞིག་ཏུ་བཅུག་ནི་ཡང་མཉམ་དུ་བཅ We demonstrate that such training retains lexical, syntactic and domain-specific constraints between domains for multiple benchmark datasets, including ones where more than one attribute change. འུ་ཅག་གིས་རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་མཉམ་ལས་དུས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཉེན་བརྟན་པར། རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མིན་ན་མི་ཚོའ'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'e-CARE: مجموعة بيانات جديدة لاستكشاف المنطق السببي القابل للتفسير', 'es': 'e-Care: un nuevo conjunto de datos para explorar el razonamiento causal explicable', 'fr': 'E-care\xa0: un nouvel ensemble de données pour explorer le raisonnement causal explicable', 'pt': 'e-CARE: um novo conjunto de dados para explorar o raciocínio causal explicável', 'ja': 'e - CARE ：説明可能な原因推論を探るための新しいデータセット', 'zh': 'e-CARE:索其可解者,新数集也', 'hi': 'ई-केयर: व्याख्यायोग्य कारण तर्क की खोज के लिए एक नया डेटासेट', 'ru': 'e-CARE: новый набор данных для изучения объяснимых причинно-следственных связей', 'ga': 'r-C횣RAM: Tacar Sonra챠 Nua chun R챕as첬n첬 C첬is챠ochta Inmh챠nithe a Ini첬chadh', 'hu': 'e-CARE: új adatkészlet a magyarázható okok indokolásának feltárására', 'el': 'Ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων για την εξερεύνηση επεξήγητης αιτιολογικής αιτιολογίας', 'ka': 'e- CARE: ახალი მონაცემები განსხვავებელი გამოსახულება', 'kk': 'e- CARE: Жаңа деректер бағдарламасының түсініктемесі', 'it': 'e-CARE: un nuovo set di dati per esplorare la motivazione causale spiegabile', 'mk': 'e-CARE: нов датотек за истрага на објаснувачки причински причини', 'lt': 'e. CARE: naujas duomenų rinkinys, skirtas išnagrinėti paaiškinamą priežastinę priežastį', 'ml': 'E- CARE: Explorable Causal Reading for New Dataset', 'mt': 'e-CARE: a New Dataset for Exploring Explainable Causal Reasoning', 'mn': 'Э-КАР: Тодорхойлсон шалтгааныг судлах шинэ өгөгдлийн сан', 'ms': 'e-CARE: Set Data Baru untuk Menjelaskan Alasan Sebab yang Boleh Dijelaskan', 'no': 'E- CARE: ein ny databaset for utforsking av utforskar avfall', 'pl': 'e-CARE: nowy zestaw danych do badania uzasadnienia wyjaśnionych przyczyn', 'ro': 'e-CARE: un nou set de date pentru explorarea motivelor de cauză explicabile', 'sr': 'E-CARE: Novi podaci za istraživanje razloga za objašnjavanje optužbe', 'so': 'e-CARE: A New Dataset for Exploring Explaiable Causal Readsiga', 'si': 'e-CARE: විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර ක්\u200dරමය සඳහා අලුත් දත්ත සැකසුම්', 'sv': 'e-CARE: en ny datauppsättning för att undersöka förklarande orsakssamband', 'ta': 'மின்னஞ்சல்- கேர்: Explorable Causal Reading for a New Dataset', 'ur': 'ایک-CARE: ایک نئی ڈیٹائیسٹ واضح قانون کے سبب تحقیق کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Elektron pochta: Ekspozitsiya olish uchun yangi maʼlumot set', 'vi': 'e-CARE: Một bộ nhớ dữ liệu mới về việc điều tra lý lẽ không thể giải thích.', 'bg': 'Електронна грижа: нов набор от данни за изследване на обяснимото причинно основание', 'da': 'e-CARE: et nyt datasæt til undersøgelse af forklarelige årsager', 'hr': 'E-CARE: Novi podaci za istraživanje objašnjih razloga optužnice', 'nl': 'e-CARE: een nieuwe dataset voor het verkennen van verklarbare oorzakelijke redenering', 'id': 'e-CARE: Dataset Baru untuk Menjelaskan alasan penyebab yang dapat dijelaskan', 'de': 'e-CARE: ein neuer Datensatz zur Erforschung erklärbarer Ursachen', 'ko': 'e-CARE: 인과 추리를 해석할 수 있는 새로운 데이터 세트 탐색', 'fa': 'یک پایگاه اطلاعات جدید برای تحقیق دلایل توضیح قابل توضیح', 'sw': 'e-CARE: a New Dataset for Exploring Explainable Causal Reasoning', 'tr': 'E-CARE:Anlaşılabilir kapatma sebepleri için yeni bir veri seti', 'af': "E- CARE: ' n Nuwe Databasis vir uitspraak Verduidelike Opkyking", 'sq': 'e-CARE: a New Dataset for Exploring Explainable Causal Reasoning', 'hy': 'e-Kare. բացատրելի պատճառների ուսումնասիրելու նոր տվյալներ', 'bn': 'ইম- কেরি: এক্সপ্লোরিং ব্যাখ্যা ব্যাখ্যা ক্যাসাল পাঠানোর জন্য একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'E-CARE: Explosible Causal Reasoning Explore for a New Data Database', 'ca': 'e-CARE: un nou conjunt de dades per investigar raons causals explicables', 'et': 'E-CARE: uus andmekogum selgitatava põhjuse põhjendamise uurimiseks', 'bs': 'E-CARE: Novi podaci za istraživanje objašnjih razloga optužbe', 'cs': 'e-CARE: nová sada dat pro zkoumání vysvětlitelného příčinového odůvodnění', 'fi': 'e-CARE: Uusi tietokokonaisuus selitettävän syy-syyn selvittämiseksi', 'ha': 'e-CARE: a New Dataset for Exploring Explainable Causal Reasoning', 'sk': 'E-CARE: nov nabor podatkov za raziskovanje razložljivega razloga vzrokov', 'jv': 'NAME:', 'he': 'e-CARE: קבוצת נתונים חדשה לחקור סיבה מסבירה', 'bo': 'e-CARE:འཚོལ་ཞིབ་སྐྱེལ་བའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་སྤྱོད་གསརཔ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་གནས་སྡུད་ཞིག་'}
{'en': 'Existing reference-free metrics have obvious limitations for evaluating controlled text generation models. Unsupervised metrics can only provide a task-agnostic evaluation result which correlates weakly with human judgments, whereas supervised ones may overfit task-specific data with poor generalization ability to other datasets. In this paper, we propose an unsupervised reference-free metric called CTRLEval, which evaluates controlled text generation from different aspects by formulating each aspect into multiple text infilling tasks. On top of these tasks, the metric assembles the generation probabilities from a pre-trained language model without any model training. Experimental results show that our metric has higher correlations with human judgments than other baselines, while obtaining better generalization of evaluating generated texts from different models and with different qualities.', 'ar': 'فهم السببية له أهمية حيوية للعديد من تطبيقات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). أبعد من الحالات المصنفة ، يمكن أن توفر التفسيرات المفاهيمية للسببية فهمًا عميقًا للحقيقة السببية لتسهيل عملية التفكير السببي. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال معلومات التفسير هذه غائبة في موارد التفكير السببي الحالية. في هذه الورقة ، نملأ هذه الفجوة من خلال تقديم مجموعة بيانات CAusal REasoning (e-CARE) المشروحة بشريًا ، والتي تحتوي على أكثر من 20 ألفًا من أسئلة التفكير السببي ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع تفسيرات مكونة من اللغة الطبيعية للأسئلة السببية.\nتظهر النتائج التجريبية أن إنشاء تفسيرات صحيحة للحقائق السببية لا يزال يمثل تحديًا خاصًا للنماذج الحديثة ، ويمكن أن تكون معلومات التفسير مفيدة في تعزيز دقة واستقرار نماذج التفكير السببي.', 'es': 'Comprender la causalidad tiene una importancia vital para varias aplicaciones de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). Más allá de los casos etiquetados, las explicaciones conceptuales de la causalidad pueden proporcionar una comprensión profunda del hecho causal para facilitar el proceso de razonamiento causal. Sin embargo, dicha información explicativa sigue ausente en los recursos de razonamiento causal existentes. En este artículo, llenamos este vacío presentando un conjunto de datos de razonamiento causal explicable anotado por humanos (e-Care), que contiene más de 20 000 preguntas de razonamiento causal, junto con explicaciones de lenguaje natural de las preguntas causales. \nLos resultados experimentales muestran que generar explicaciones válidas para los hechos causales sigue siendo especialmente difícil para los modelos más modernos, y la información explicativa puede ser útil para promover la precisión y la estabilidad de los modelos de razonamiento causal.', 'pt': 'Compreender a causalidade tem uma importância vital para várias aplicações de Processamento de Linguagem Natural (NLP). Além das instâncias rotuladas, as explicações conceituais da causalidade podem fornecer uma compreensão profunda do fato causal para facilitar o processo de raciocínio causal. No entanto, tal informação explicativa ainda permanece ausente nos recursos de raciocínio causal existentes. Neste artigo, preenchemos essa lacuna apresentando um conjunto de dados CAusal REasoning explicável anotado por humanos (e-CARE), que contém mais de 20 mil perguntas de raciocínio causal, juntamente com explicações formadas em linguagem natural das perguntas causais.\nOs resultados experimentais mostram que gerar explicações válidas para fatos causais ainda permanece especialmente desafiador para os modelos de última geração, e as informações explicativas podem ser úteis para promover a precisão e a estabilidade dos modelos de raciocínio causal.', 'fr': "Comprendre la causalité est d'une importance vitale pour diverses applications de traitement du langage naturel (NLP). Au-delà des cas étiquetés, les explications conceptuelles de la causalité peuvent fournir une compréhension approfondie du fait causal afin de faciliter le processus de raisonnement causal. Toutefois, ces informations explicatives restent absentes des ressources de raisonnement causal existantes. Dans cet article, nous comblons cette lacune en présentant un ensemble de données de raisonnement causal explicable annoté par l'homme (e-Care), qui contient plus de 20 000 questions de raisonnement causal, ainsi que des explications en langage naturel des questions causales. \nLes résultats expérimentaux montrent que la génération d'explications valides pour les faits causaux reste particulièrement difficile pour les modèles de pointe, et les informations explicatives peuvent être utiles pour promouvoir l'exactitude et la stabilité des modèles de raisonnement causal.", 'ja': '因果関係を理解することは、さまざまな自然言語処理（ NLP ）アプリケーションにとって非常に重要です。 標識された事例を超えて、因果関係の概念的説明は、因果関係の推論プロセスを促進するために因果関係の事実を深く理解することができる。 しかし、このような説明情報は、既存の因果推論リソースでは依然として存在しない。 この論文では、20,000を超える因果推論の質問を含む人間が注釈した説明可能なCAusal REasoningデータセット（ e - CARE ）と、因果推論の質問の説明を形成した自然言語を提示することで、このギャップを埋めています。 \n実験結果は、最先端のモデルにとって、因果事実の妥当な説明を生成することは依然として特に困難であり、説明情報は、因果推論モデルの正確性と安定性を促進するのに役立つ可能性があることを示している。', 'zh': '知因果关系于百自然语言(NLP)应用程序至重。 除实例之外,因果关系概念性解释,可以深解因果,以趣因果之理。 然于现在因果推理资源中,此说信息仍缺。 于本文中,发一人解释CAusal REasoning数集(e-CARE)以补其空,当数集包过20K因果推理,及自然语言成因果之说。 \n实验结果表明之于模形也,生成于因果事实之说犹特有挑战性,说信有助于推理模型准确性稳定性。', 'hi': 'विभिन्न प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) अनुप्रयोगों के लिए कार्य-कारण को समझना महत्वपूर्ण महत्व रखता है। लेबल किए गए उदाहरणों से परे, कारण की वैचारिक व्याख्याएं कारण तर्क प्रक्रिया को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए कारण तथ्य की गहरी समझ प्रदान कर सकती हैं। हालांकि, इस तरह की स्पष्टीकरण जानकारी अभी भी मौजूदा कारण तर्क संसाधनों में अनुपस्थित रहती है। इस पेपर में, हम एक मानव-एनोटेट समझाए जाने योग्य CAusal REasoning dataset (e-CARE) प्रस्तुत करके इस अंतर को भरते हैं, जिसमें 20K से अधिक कारण तर्क प्रश्न होते हैं, साथ ही प्राकृतिक भाषा के साथ कारण प्रश्नों के स्पष्टीकरण का गठन किया जाता है। \nप्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि कारण तथ्यों के लिए वैध स्पष्टीकरण उत्पन्न करना अभी भी अत्याधुनिक मॉडल के लिए विशेष रूप से चुनौतीपूर्ण बना हुआ है, और स्पष्टीकरण जानकारी कारण तर्क मॉडल की सटीकता और स्थिरता को बढ़ावा देने के लिए सहायक हो सकती है।', 'ru': 'Понимание причинно-следственной связи имеет жизненно важное значение для различных приложений обработки естественного языка (NLP). Помимо отмеченных случаев, концептуальные объяснения причинно-следственной связи могут обеспечить глубокое понимание причинно-следственной связи для облегчения процесса установления причинно-следственной связи. Однако такая пояснительная информация по-прежнему отсутствует в существующих ресурсах причинно-следственной связи. В этой статье мы заполняем этот пробел, представляя аннотированный человеком объяснимый набор данных CAusal Reasoning (e-CARE), который содержит более 20 000 вопросов причинно-следственной связи, а также естественные объяснения причинно-следственных вопросов. \nЭкспериментальные результаты показывают, что создание достоверных объяснений причинно-следственных связей по-прежнему остается особенно сложной задачей для современных моделей, и пояснительная информация может быть полезна для повышения точности и стабильности моделей причинно-следственных связей.', 'ga': 'Tá an-tábhacht ag baint le cúisíocht a thuiscint d’fheidhmchláir éagsúla Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP). Taobh amuigh de na cásanna lipéadaithe, is féidir le mínithe coincheapúla ar an gcúisíocht tuiscint dhomhain a sholáthar ar an bhfíric chúise chun an próiseas réasúnaíochta cúisíoch a éascú. Mar sin féin, tá faisnéis mhínithe den sórt sin fós in easnamh sna hacmhainní réasúnaíochta cúise atá ann cheana féin. Sa pháipéar seo, líonaimid an bhearna seo trí thacar sonraí Réasúnuithe Cúise (e-CÚRAM) atá anótáilte ag an duine a chur i láthair, ina bhfuil os cionn 20K ceisteanna réasúnaíochta cúisí, mar aon le mínithe ar na ceisteanna cúiseacha a foirmíodh sa teanga nádúrtha.\nLéiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil sé fós ina dhúshlán ar leith do na samhlacha úrscothacha mínithe bailí a ghiniúint ar fhíorais chúiseacha, agus is féidir leis an bhfaisnéis míniúcháin a bheith ina chuidiú chun cruinneas agus cobhsaíocht na múnlaí réasúnaíochta cúise a chur chun cinn.', 'ka': 'პარამეტრების მიზეზი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია განსხვავებული ნაირადი ენის პროცესისთვის (NLP) პროცესისთვის. მინიშნული ინსტენსების გარეშე კონცექტური განახსნა მიზეზეზეზეზების გარეშე შეუძლია ძალიან გაგრძნობა მიზეზეზი ფაქტის შესაძლებლობად მიზეზეზი პარა მაგრამ ასეთი განახსნა ინფორმაცია უკვე არსებობს წარმოდგენებული მიზეზი რესურსებში. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ამ განსხვავებას შევყვანეთ ადამიანის ანოტირებული განსხვავებელი მონაცემების შესახებ (e-CARE), რომელიც უფრო მეტი 20K-ზე მეტი წარმოადგენების კითხვები, და თავიდან მიზეზი ენის განსხვავება მი', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση της αιτιώδους συνάφειας έχει ζωτική σημασία για διάφορες εφαρμογές επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Πέρα από τις επισημασμένες περιπτώσεις, εννοιολογικές εξηγήσεις της αιτιώδους συνάφειας μπορούν να παρέχουν βαθιά κατανόηση του αιτιώδους γεγονότος για να διευκολύνουν τη διαδικασία αιτιώδους συλλογισμού. Ωστόσο, τέτοιες επεξηγηματικές πληροφορίες εξακολουθούν να απουσιάζουν από τους υπάρχοντες πόρους αιτιώδους συλλογισμού. Στην παρούσα εργασία, ολοκληρώνουμε αυτό το κενό παρουσιάζοντας ένα από ανθρώπους σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων αιτιώδους συλλογισμού (το οποίο περιέχει πάνω από 20Κ ερωτήματα αιτιώδους συλλογισμού, μαζί με τις ερμηνείες της φυσικής γλώσσας που σχηματίζονται για τα αιτιώδη ερωτήματα.', 'it': "Comprendere la causalità ha importanza vitale per varie applicazioni di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP). Oltre alle istanze etichettate, le spiegazioni concettuali della causalità possono fornire una profonda comprensione del fatto causale per facilitare il processo di ragionamento causale. Tuttavia, tali informazioni esplicative rimangono ancora assenti nelle risorse di ragionamento causale esistenti. In questo articolo, colmiamo questa lacuna presentando un dataset CAusal REasoning spiegabile (e-CARE) annotato dall'uomo, che contiene oltre 20K domande di ragionamento causale, insieme a spiegazioni del linguaggio naturale delle domande causali.", 'kk': 'Тәуелді тіл процессорының (NLP) қолданбаларының маңызды маңыздығын түсініңіз. Жарлық мәселелерден басқа, себептердің концептуалды түсініктемелері себептердің себептерінің түсініктерін көмектесуге болады. Бірақ бұл түсініктеме мәліметі бар себепті ресурстарда әлі жоқ. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл аралығын адамдардың түсініктірілген кеңістіктерді (e-CARE) түсініп беріп тұрамыз. Бұл 20 000 жылдан артық түсініктер сұрақтары бар, негізгі сұрақтардың табиғи тілі түсініктемелерімен бі', 'ms': 'Memahami penyebab mempunyai penting penting untuk pelbagai aplikasi Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP). Selain kejadian yang ditabel, penjelasan konseptual tentang penyebabnya boleh memberikan pemahaman mendalam tentang fakta penyebabnya untuk memudahkan proses penyebabnya. However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengisi ruang ini dengan memperkenalkan set data Reasoning CAUSAL yang boleh dijelaskan oleh manusia (e-CARE), yang mengandungi lebih dari 20K soalan reasoning penyebab, bersama dengan penjelasan bahasa semula jadi soalan penyebab.', 'lt': 'Dėl priežastinio ryšio supratimas yra labai svarbus įvairioms gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) programoms. Be pažymėtų atvejų, priežastinio ryšio koncepciniai paaiškinimai gali suteikti išsamų supratimą apie priežastinį faktą, kad būtų lengviau pagrįsti priežastinius argumentus. Tačiau tokios paaiškinimo informacijos vis dar nėra esamuose priežastiniuose pagrindimo ištekliuose. Šiame dokumente užpildome šią spragą pateikdami žmogaus anotuotą paaiškinamą priežastinio pagrindimo duomenų rinkinį (e-CARE), kuriame yra daugiau kaip 20 000 priežastinių motyvavimo klausimų, kartu su priežastinių klausimų paaiškinimais, suformuotais natūralia kalba.', 'hu': 'Az okozati összefüggés megértése létfontosságú a különböző Natural Language Processing (NLP) alkalmazások számára. A megjelölt eseteken túl az okozati összefüggés fogalmi magyarázatai mélyreható megértést nyújthatnak az okozati tény megkönnyítése érdekében. Az ilyen magyarázatokra vonatkozó információk azonban továbbra is hiányoznak a meglévő okozati érvelési forrásokban. Ebben a tanulmányban ezt a hiányt kitöltjük egy ember által jegyzett, megmagyarázható CAusal REasoning adathalmazt (e-CARE) bemutatásával, amely több mint 20 ezer okozati érvelési kérdést tartalmaz, valamint az okozati kérdések természetes nyelvi magyarázatával együtt.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ (NLP) പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേറെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയ കാരണങ്ങളുടെ കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ആഴത്തില്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കും. എന്നാലും ഇത്തരം വിശദീകരണവിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴും നിലവിലുള്ള കാരണ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d ഇല്ല. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മനുഷ്യന്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന കായുസാല്\u200d റെയോസോണിങ് ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റ് കൊടുക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ വേര്\u200dപ്പ് നി', 'no': 'Forståking av grunnlag har viktig viktighet for forskjellige naturspråk-prosesseringar (NLP). Utan dei merkelige instansene kan konseptuelle forklaringar av grunnersakelsen gje dypt forståelse av den grunnefaktoren for å gjera det følgjande årsakelsprosessen. Desse forklaringasinformasjonane er imidlertid i eksisterande grunnleggjande ressursar. I denne papiret fyller vi denne mellomrommet ved å visa ei menneskeopplysningsdatasett (e-CARE), som inneheld over 20K grunnlag av grunnlag, saman med naturspråk formerte forklaringar av grunnleggjande spørsmålene.', 'mn': 'Яагаад гэдгийг ойлгох нь олон Байгалийн хэл Процессор (NLP) хэрэглээнд чухал чухал. Нэрэглэгдсэн тодорхойлолтуудын гадна, шалтгааны тодорхойлолтуудын тухай шалтгаан үйлдвэрлэлийн тухай үндсэн ойлголтыг дэмжиж чадна. Гэвч ийм тодорхойлолт мэдээлэл суурилсан шалтгааныг шалтгаалдаг боломжтой байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүн төрөлхтний тайлбарлаж өгөгдлийн санаа (e-CARE) өгөгдлийн санааг илэрхийлэхэд энэ ялгааг дүүргэдэг.', 'mk': 'Разбирањето на причината има суштинска важност за различните апликации за процес на природен јазик (НЛП). Покрај обележаните случаи, концептуалните објаснувања за причината може да обезбедат длабоко разбирање на причинниот факт за олеснување на процесот на причинско размислување. However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources.  Во овој документ, ја пополнуваме оваа празнина со презентација на човечки објаснувачки компјутер на податоци за размислување на причината (e-CARE), кој содржи повеќе од 20.000 причинни размислувачки прашања, заедно со природен јазик формирани објаснувања за причинните прашања.', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie związku przyczynowego ma kluczowe znaczenie dla różnych aplikacji Natural Language Processing (NLP). Poza oznaczonymi przypadkami koncepcyjne wyjaśnienia związku przyczynowego mogą zapewnić głębokie zrozumienie faktu przyczynowego, aby ułatwić proces rozumowania przyczynowego. Jednakże takie informacje wyjaśniające nadal pozostają nieobecne w istniejących zasobach rozumowania przyczynowego. W niniejszym artykule wypełniamy tę lukę poprzez przedstawienie anotatowanego przez człowieka zbioru danych CAusal REasoning (e-CARE), który zawiera ponad 20K pytania o rozumowanie przyczynowe, wraz z językiem naturalnym formowane wyjaśnienia pytań przyczynowych.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea cauzalității are o importanță vitală pentru diferite aplicații de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL). Dincolo de cazurile etichetate, explicațiile conceptuale ale cauzalității pot oferi o înțelegere profundă a faptului cauzal pentru a facilita procesul de raționament cauzal. Cu toate acestea, astfel de informații de explicare rămân încă absente în resursele existente de raționament cauzal. În această lucrare, vom umple acest gol prezentând un set de date explicabil CAusal REasoning (e-CARE), care conține peste 20.000 de întrebări de raționament cauzal, împreună cu explicații formate de limbaj natural ale întrebărilor cauzale.', 'so': "Waxgarashada sababta ayaa muhiim u ah in la sameeyo codsiga afka asalka ah (NLP). Xaaladaha la qoray ka sokow, fasaxa fikradda ah ee sababtu waxay keeni karaan waxgarasho aad u dheer oo sababta sababta ah, taas oo u sahlin kara baaritaanka sababta ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, macluumaadkaas oo faa'iidada ah weli ma jiraan fursad sabab ah. Qoraalkan ayaannu buuxinnaa burburka, waxaana soo bandhignaynaa sawirada qofka loo caddeeyey e e lagu caddeeyo karo (e-CARE), kaas oo ku jira su'aalo ka badan 20K sababta sababta ah, isla markaasna waxaa lagu sameynayaa fasirada afka dabiicadda ee lagu sameeyo su'aalaha sababta ah.", 'sr': 'Razumevanje uzrokovanih različitih primjena prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP). Iznad etiketiranih slučajeva, konceptualne objašnjenje uzrokovanih uzrokovanih može pružiti duboko razumevanje uzrokovane činjenice da olakša proces uzrokovanih razuma. Međutim, takve informacije o objašnjenju još uvijek ostaju odsutne u postojećim uzrokovanim resursima razuma. U ovom papiru, ispunjavamo taj praznik predstavljajući ljudski označavajući objašnjavajući komplet podataka o odgovaranju optužbe (e-CARE), koji sadrži više od 20.000 različitih pitanja, zajedno sa prirodnim jezikom formiranim objašnjenjima uzrokovanih pitanja.', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tal-kawżalità għandu importanza vitali għal diversi applikazzjonijiet għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP). Lil hinn mill-każijiet ittikkettati, spjegazzjonijiet kunċettwali tal-kawżalità jistgħu jipprovdu fehim profond tal-fatt kawżali biex jiffaċilita l-proċess ta’ raġunament kawżali. Madankollu, informazzjoni ta’ spjegazzjoni bħal din għadha nieqsa fir-riżorsi ta’ raġunament kawżali eżistenti. In this paper, we fill this gap by presenting a human-annotated explainable CAusal REasoning dataset (e-CARE), which contains over 20K causal reasoning questions, together with natural language formed explanations of the causal questions.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය (NLP) විවිධ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා විශේෂ වැදගත්ත විශේෂ ලේබල් කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පස්සේ, කාරණාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොඳ තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් කාරණාත්මක ප්\u200dරති නමුත්, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරකාශනය තොරතුරු තියෙන්නේ තියෙන්නේ නැති විදියට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් නිසා. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ වැඩක් පූර්ණ කරනවා මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් CAuse REssoring data set (e-CARE), ඒක 20K වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ස', 'sv': 'Att förstå orsakssamband har avgörande betydelse för olika Natural Language Processing (NLP) applikationer. Utöver de märkta fallen kan konceptuella förklaringar av orsakssambandet ge djup förståelse för orsakssambandet för att underlätta orsakssamband processen. Sådan förklaringsinformation saknas dock fortfarande i befintliga resurser för orsakssamband. I denna uppsats fyller vi denna lucka genom att presentera en mänsklig-kommenterad förklaringsbar CAusal REasoning dataset (e-CARE), som innehåller över 20K orsakssamband frågor, tillsammans med naturligt språk formade förklaringar av orsakssamband frågor.', 'ur': 'سمجھنے کی وجہ سے مختلف طبیعی زبان پرینس (NLP) کے لئے ضرورت ہے۔ لیبل کی مثالیں کے علاوہ، دلیل کی نظریہ تفصیل کی عمیق سمجھ سکتی ہے کہ دلیل منطقی پروسس کو آسان کرے۔ However, such explanation information remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے یہ فاصلہ بھر کر ایک انسان کے ذریعہ سے واضح کرنا قابل توضیح کے ذریعہ ڈیٹ سٹ (e-CARE) کو دکھایا ہے جس میں 20 کیلوں سے زیادہ دلیل دلیل سؤال رکھتے ہیں، اور طبیعی زبان کے ساتھ دلیل سؤال کی توضیح پیدا کی ہے۔', 'ta': 'புரிந்து கொள்ளும் காரணங்கள் பல இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளுக்கு முக்கியமானது. குறிப்பிட்ட நிகழ்வுகளை தவிர, காரணத்தின் விளக்கம் ஆழமாக புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் காரணத்தினால் காரணத்தினால் புரிந ஆனால், இந்த விளக்கம் தகவல் இன்னும் இல்லை ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் காரணங்களின் வளங்களில். இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் இந்த இடைவெளியை நிரப்புகிறோம் ஒரு மனிதன் அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட கேயூஸால் ரியாஸோனிங் தகவல் அமைப்பு (e- CARE) கூறினால், அதில் 20K க்கு மேற்', 'vi': 'Hiểu rõ nhân quả là quan trọng thiết yếu cho các ứng dụng xử ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Vượt qua các trường hợp được đánh dấu, các giải thích về nhân quả có thể cung cấp hiểu sâu về sự kiện nguyên nhân để dễ dàng giải thích nguyên nhân. Tuy nhiên, thông tin giải thích này vẫn chưa có trong nguồn gốc nguyên nhân Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta lấp đầy khoảng trống này bằng cách đưa ra một tập tin dựa vào CAsử có thể giải thích được, chứa đầy các câu hỏi về nguyên nhân vụ 20K, cùng với những giải thích ngôn ngữ tự nhiên về các câu hỏi nguyên nhân.', 'uz': "Aniqlik sababni tushunish uchun har xil tilni boshqarish (NLP) dasturlariga muhim muhim. Beyond the labeled instances, conceptual explanations of the causality can provide deep understanding of the causal fact to facilitate the causal reasoning process.  Lekin, bu tafsilotlar mavjud sabablar uchun mavjud manbalar mavjud emas. Bu qogʻozda, biz bu gap o'ylab kelamiz, oddiy qo'shilgan CAusal REasoning maʼlumotlar tarkibini (e-CARE) koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu yerda 20,000 dan ortiq sabablar sabablar sabablar soʻzlari bor, va asl tili sabablar soʻzlarining asosiy soʻzlarini o'rganishda.", 'bg': 'Разбирането на причинно-следствената връзка има жизненоважно значение за различни приложения за обработка на естествения език (НЛП). Освен етикетираните случаи, концептуалните обяснения на причинно-следствената връзка могат да осигурят дълбоко разбиране на причинно-следствената връзка, за да улеснят процеса на причинно-следствена разсъждения. Такава информация за обяснение обаче все още липсва в съществуващите ресурси за причинно-следствена логика. В тази статия ние запълваме тази празнота, като представим обоснован с човешко обяснение набор от данни за каузално разсъждение (който съдържа над 20 000 въпроса за причинно разсъждение, заедно с естествения език формирани обяснения на причинно-следствените въпроси.', 'nl': 'Het begrijpen van causaliteit is van vitaal belang voor verschillende Natural Language Processing (NLP) toepassingen. Naast de gelabelde gevallen kunnen conceptuele verklaringen van de causaliteit diepgaand inzicht geven in het causale feit om het causale redeneerproces te vergemakkelijken. Dergelijke verklaringsinformatie blijft echter nog steeds afwezig in bestaande bronnen voor causaal redeneren. In dit artikel vullen we deze kloof op door een door mensen geannoteerde uitlegbare CAusal REasoning dataset (e-CARE) te presenteren, die meer dan 20K causal redeneering vragen bevat, samen met natuurlijke taal gevormde verklaringen van de causale vragen.', 'da': 'Forståelse af årsagssammenhæng har afgørende betydning for forskellige Natural Language Processing (NLP) applikationer. Ud over de mærkede tilfælde kan konceptuelle forklaringer af årsagssammenhængen give dyb forståelse af årsagssammenhængen for at lette årsagssammenhængen proces. Sådanne forklaringsoplysninger mangler imidlertid stadig i de eksisterende årsagsbegrundelsesressourcer. I denne artikel udfylder vi dette hul ved at præsentere et menneskeligt kommenteret forklareligt CAusal REasoning datasæt (e-CARE), som indeholder over 20.000 kausal ræsonnement spørgsmål, sammen med naturligt sprogdannede forklaringer på kausal spørgsmål.', 'de': 'Das Verständnis der Kausalität ist für verschiedene Anwendungen der Natural Language Processing (NLP) von entscheidender Bedeutung. Über die gekennzeichneten Fälle hinaus können konzeptuelle Erklärungen der Kausalität tiefes Verständnis der kausalen Tatsache liefern, um den kausalen Denkprozess zu erleichtern. Solche Erklärungsinformationen fehlen jedoch noch in bestehenden Ressourcen zur kausalen Begründung. In diesem Beitrag füllen wir diese Lücke, indem wir einen human-annotierten erklärbaren CAusal REasoning Datensatz (e-CARE) vorstellen, der mehr als 20K kausale Argumentationsfragen enthält, zusammen mit natursprachlich gebildeten Erklärungen der kausalen Fragen.', 'ko': '인과관계를 이해하는 것은 각종 자연언어처리(NLP) 응용에 매우 중요하다.표기된 실례를 제외하고 인과 관계의 개념 해석은 인과 사실에 대한 깊은 이해를 제공하여 인과 추리 과정을 추진할 수 있다.그러나 기존의 인과 추리 자원에서 이런 해석 정보는 여전히 부족하다.본고에서 우리는 인류 주석의 해석 가능한 인과 추리 데이터 집합(e-cARE)을 제공함으로써 이 공백을 메운다. 이 데이터 집합은 20K개가 넘는 인과 추리 문제와 인과 문제에 대한 자연 언어 해석을 포함한다.', 'id': 'Memahami penyebab memiliki penting penting untuk berbagai aplikasi Proses Bahasa Alam (NLP). Selain kasus-kasus yang ditabel, penjelasan konseptual tentang penyebabnya dapat menyediakan pemahaman mendalam tentang fakta penyebabnya untuk memudahkan proses penyebabnya. Namun, informasi penjelasan tersebut masih tidak ada dalam sumber alasan yang ada. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengisi ruang ini dengan mempersembahkan sebuah dataset alasan penyebab yang dapat dijelaskan oleh manusia (e-CARE), yang mengandung lebih dari 20.000 pertanyaan alasan, bersama dengan bahasa alam yang membentuk penjelasan tentang pertanyaan penyebab.', 'fa': 'فهمیدن دلایل مهم برای کاربردهای مختلف پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) است. بیرون این موارد که علامت زده شده\u200cاند، توضیح\u200cهای مفهوم\u200cای از دلایل می\u200cتوانند درک عمیق درباره\u200cی حقیقت دلایل را برای آسان کردن فرایند منطق\u200cکننده\u200cی دلیل\u200cهای سبک تحصیل دهند. ولی این اطلاعات توضیح هنوز در منابع منطقی وجود دارد. در این کاغذ، ما این فاصله را پر می کنیم با نشان دادن یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای قابل توضیح و توضیح قابل توضیح داده\u200cای (e-CARE) که بیش از ۲۰ کیلومتر سؤال دلیل منطقی وجود دارد، با توضیح\u200cهای زبان طبیعی از سؤال\u200cهای باعث دلیل\u200c', 'sw': 'Kuelewa sababu ina umuhimu mkubwa kwa matumizi mbalimbali ya utaratibu wa lugha za asili (NLP). Zaidi ya matukio yaliyotajwa, maelezo ya dhana ya sababu yanaweza kutoa uelewa wa kina wa sababu ya kusaidia mchakato wa maana. However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources.  Katika karatasi hii, tunajaza gaidi hili kwa kutoa taarifa zinazoelezwa na binadamu zinazoelezea (e-CARE), ambayo ina zaidi ya maswali yanayosababisha sababu ya 20,000, pamoja na maelezo ya lugha ya asili yaliyotengenezwa kwa maswali yanayosababishwa.', 'tr': 'Tebiýal diller işlemek üçin nähili möhüm bar. Etiketlenmiş durumlardan ötesinde sebeplerin düşüncelerinin derin anlamasını sebep mantıklı mantıklı prosesini kolaylaştırmak için sağlayabilir. Ýöne şeýle bir düşündirim maglumaty häli hem bolan sebäbi sebäpli sebäpli rezultatlarda ýok. Bu kagyzda, biz bu boşluky adamlaryň üstüne görkezilýän CAusal REasoning veri setirini (e-CARE) duýduryp, bu boşluky 20K üstünde sebäpli soraglary bar we tebigy dil sebäpli soraglaryň düşündirişleri bilen doldurýarys.', 'af': "Verstaan oorsaaklikheid het belangrikheid vir verskeie Natuurlike Taal Prosessering (NLP) toepassings. Buitend die gemerkte voorbeelde kan konseptieële uitduidelings van die oorsaaklikheid diep verstanding van die oorsaaklike feit verskaf om die oorsaaklike redesproses te eenvoudig. Maar sodanige verklaring inligting bly nog steeds absent in bestaande redelike hulpbronne. In hierdie papier, ons vul hierdie afstand deur 'n menslike-annotateerde verduidelike opstel van 'n verduidelike opstel van 'n verduidelike opstel van 'n verduidelike opstel (e-CARE), wat bevat oor 20K oorsaaklike rede vrae, saam met natuurlike taal gevorm verduidelike van die oorsaaklike vrae.", 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i causalitetit ka rëndësi jetike për aplikimet e ndryshme të Procesimit të Gjuhave Natyrore (NLP). Përtej rasteve të etiketuara, shpjegimet konceptuale të shkaktueshmërisë mund të sigurojnë kuptim të thellë të faktit shkaktues për të lehtësuar procesin e arsyetimit shkaktues. However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources.  Në këtë letër, ne mbushim këtë boshllëk duke paraqitur një grup të dhënash të shpjeguara të arsyetimit të shkakut (e-CARE) që përmban mbi 20.000 pyetje arsyetimi të shkakut, së bashku me gjuhën natyrore të formuar shpjegime të pyetjeve të shkakut.', 'am': 'ማስታወቂያውን ምክንያት ለባሕላዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮግራሞች (NLP) መጠቀሚያ muhimu ነው፡፡ ከታወቀ ምሳሌዎች በቀር፣ የውነቱ መግለጫ የውነቱን ጥልቅ ማስተዋል ማቅረብ ይችላል፡፡ However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources.  በዚህ ካላት፣ ይህ ክፍል በሰው ላይ የሚታወቀውን የካኡል ሪፖኖን ዳታተር (e-CARE) በመስጠት እናሞላታለን፡፡', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje uzrokovanja ima važnu važnost za različite primjene prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP). Iznad označenih slučajeva, konceptualne objašnjenje uzrokovanja može pružiti duboko razumijevanje uzrokovane činjenice kako bi olakšalo proces uzrokovanja. Međutim, takve informacije o objašnjenju još uvijek nisu u postojećim uzrokovanim resursima. U ovom papiru ispunjavamo taj praznik predstavljajući ljudski označeni komplet podataka o odgovaranju optužnica (e-CARE), koji sadrži više od 20K različitih pitanja, zajedno s prirodnim jezikom formiranim objašnjenjima uzročnih pitanja.', 'hy': 'Պատճառականության հասկանալը կարևոր է տարբեր բնական լեզվի մշակումների համար: Պատճառների պատճառի գաղափարական բացատրությունները կարող են ավելի խորը հասկանալ պատճառի փաստը, որպեսզի հեշտացնեն պատճառի մտածողության գործընթացը: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս բացատրությունների տեղեկատվությունը դեռևս բացակայում է գոյություն ունեցող պատճառային մտածողական ռեսուրսների մեջ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լրացնում ենք այս տարբերությունը մարդկային նկարագրված բացատրելի CAUSL REASոնing տվյալների համակարգով (e-CAUSE), որը պարունակում է ավելի քան 20.000 պատճառային մտածողական հարցեր, միասին բնական լեզուների հետ կապված պատճառային հարցերի բացատրություններ:', 'az': 'Düşünmək sebebi müxtəlif təbiətli dil işləməsi (NLP) proqramları üçün çox vacibdir. Etilmiş olaraq, causaliyyətin müəyyənləşdirilməsi səbəbi olaraq səbəb dəyişiklik prosesini asanlaşdırmaq üçün səbəb faktının derin anlaşılmasını sağlayar. Ancaq bu açıq-aydın məlumatlar hələ də mövcuddur səbəb mənfəətlərində yox idilər. Bu kağızda, biz bu boşluğu insanların a çıq-aydınlaşdırılabilir CAusal REasoning veri qutusu (e-CARE) ilə doldururuq, bu boşluğu 20.000-dən fazla layiq fikirləşdirmək sualları ilə təbiətli dil, causal sualların açıqlaması ilə birlikdə.', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje uzrokovanja ima vitalnu važnost za različite aplikacije prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP). Izvan etiketiranih slučajeva, konceptualno objašnjenje uzrokovanih uzrokovanih može pružiti duboko razumijevanje uzrokovanih činjenica da olakša proces uzrokovanih razuma. Međutim, takve informacije o objašnjenju još uvijek ostaju odsutne u postojećim različitim resursima. U ovom papiru, ispunjavamo taj praznik predstavljajući ljudski navedeni objašnjavajući komplet podataka o odgovaranju optužnica (e-CARE), koji sadrži preko 20K različitih pitanja, zajedno s prirodnim jezikom formiranim objašnjenjima uzrokovanih pitanja.', 'bn': 'বুঝতে পারার কারণে বিভিন্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া (NLP) অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গুরু চিহ্নিত ঘটনাগুলো ছাড়াও, এই কারণের ব্যাখ্যা গভীর বোঝাতে পারে যে কারণের কারণের প্রক্রিয়াকে সুবিধা দিতে পারে। However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মানুষ-ব্যাখ্যা করা এক ব্যাখ্যাত ক্যাসাল রিসোনিং ডাটাসেট (ই-কেরি) উপস্থাপন করে এই বিভ্রান্তি পূর্ণ করি, যার মধ্যে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ব', 'cs': 'Pochopení kauzality má zásadní význam pro různé aplikace Natural Language Processing (NLP). Kromě označených instancí, konceptuální vysvětlení kauzality mohou poskytnout hluboké pochopení kauzální skutečnosti, aby usnadnily proces kauzálního uvažování. Takové vysvětlení však stále chybí ve stávajících zdrojích kauzálního uvažování. V tomto článku tuto mezeru vyplňujeme představením člověkem anotované vysvětlitelné sady CAusal REasoning dat (e-CARE), která obsahuje více než 20K otázky kauzálního uvažování, spolu s přirozeným jazykem vysvětlení kauzálních otázek.', 'et': 'Põhjusliku seose mõistmine on oluline erinevate loodusliku keele töötlemise (NLP) rakenduste jaoks. Peale märgistatud juhtumite võivad põhjusliku seose kontseptuaalsed selgitused anda põhjusliku fakti põhjalikku mõistmist, et hõlbustada põhjusliku mõtlemise protsessi. Selline selgitusteave puudub siiski olemasolevates põhjuslike põhjuslike põhjenduste ressurssides. Käesolevas töös täidame selle lünga, esitades inimese märkustega selgitatava CAusal REasoning andmekogumi (e-CARE), mis sisaldab üle 20 000 põhjusliku arutlusküsimuse ning loodusliku keele moodustatud põhjuslike küsimuste selgitusi.', 'fi': 'Syy-yhteyden ymmärtäminen on elintärkeää erilaisissa Natural Language Processing (NLP) -sovelluksissa. Merkittyjen tapausten lisäksi kausaalisuuden käsitteelliset selitykset voivat tarjota syvällistä ymmärrystä kausaalista faktaa helpottamaan kausaalista päättelyprosessia. Tällaista selitystä ei kuitenkaan ole vielä olemassa olevissa syy-päättelyresursseissa. Tässä artikkelissa täytämme tämän aukon esittämällä ihmisen selittämän CAusal REasoning datasetin (e-CARE), joka sisältää yli 20 000 kausaalista päättelykysymystä sekä luonnollisen kielen muodostamia selityksiä kausaalisille kysymyksille.', 'ca': "Entendre la causalitat té una importància vital per a diverses aplicacions de processament de llenguatges naturals. A més enllà dels casos etiquetats, explicacions conceptuals de la causalitat poden proporcionar una comprensió profunda del fet causal per facilitar el procés de raonament causal. No obstant això, aquesta informació d'explicació encara no existeix en els recursos de raonament causal existents. En aquest article, omplem aquest buit presentant un conjunt de dades explicables de raonament causal (e-CARE) anotats per humans, que conté més de 20.000 preguntes de raonament causal, juntament amb explicacions formades en llenguatge natural de les preguntes causals.", 'jv': 'Rasané sampeyang akeh akeh sing klêrung kanggo aplikasi Perusahaan Ingkang Daerah (NLP). Genjer-genjer perusahaan kelangan kelangan sampeyan akeh iso nggawe ngerasah luwih apik perusahaan winih kanggo ngedolog perusahaan akeh sampeyan kawek dhéwé. Nanging, ketahane kapan-kapan nganggo informasi durung isih durung lagi katimbang apakno. Nang pepulan iki, kéné kesempaké gap iki dadi nggawe gerakan luwih apik perbudhakan langkung: Causah REMOSS dataset', 'sk': 'Razumevanje vzročne zveze je ključnega pomena za različne aplikacije za obdelavo naravnega jezika (NLP). Poleg označenih primerov lahko konceptualna razlaga vzročne zveze zagotovijo globoko razumevanje vzročnega dejstva in olajšajo proces vzročnega sklepanja. Vendar pa v obstoječih virih vzročnega razmišljanja še vedno ni podatkov o takih pojasnilih. V prispevku to vrzel zapolnimo s predstavitvijo človeških oznak razložljivega nabora podatkov CAusal REasonning (e-CARE), ki vsebuje več kot 20.000 vzročnih razlogov, skupaj z naravnim jezikom oblikovanimi razlagami vzročnih vprašanj.', 'he': 'להבין את הסיבות יש חשיבות חיונית עבור שיעורי תהליך השפה הטבעית (NLP) שונים. מעבר למקרים המתווידים, הסברים הרעיוניים של הסיבות יכולים לספק הבנה עמוקה של העובדה הסיבית כדי להקל את תהליך ההיגיון הסיבי. However, such explanation information still remains absent in existing causal reasoning resources.  בעיתון הזה, אנו ממלאים את הפער הזה על ידי הצגת קבוצת נתונים מסבירים על סיבות סיבה (e-CARE), שמכילה יותר מ-20 אלף שאלות סיבות סיבות, יחד עם שפה טבעית נוצרה הסברים על שאלות הסיבה.', 'ha': "Understanding causality has vital importance for various Natural Language Processing (NLP) applications.  Bayoni da misãlan da aka rubũta, fassarar fanatin na zato yana iya ga fahimta mai girma ga matsayin da za'a sauƙaƙara fassarar masu sababi. A lokacin da, wannan fassarar lãbãri bado ba ta wadãta ba a cikin maɓallin sababuwa. Ga wannan takardan, za mu cika wannan gap da za'a gaura da wani zane da aka sanar da mutum da cewa na fassarar karace (e-CAER), wanda ke ƙunsa da wasu masĩfar masu saba'a 20,000, sami da fassarar harshen asiyya da aka danne su masu sakan.", 'bo': 'རྟོགས་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་ནང་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་མེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱ་རིམ། ཤོག་བྱང་བཟོས་པའི་དཔེ་བསྐུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་ཉེན་ཅིག་གིས་རྐྱེན་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཡར་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤིག་ལ ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་དག་གནས་ཚུལ་དུ་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཐོག་ཏུ་མེད་པ་རེད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མི་རྣམས་ལ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བར་སྟོང་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཉེན་བརྗོད་འདི་ལྟར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Redistributing Low-Frequency Words: Making the Most of Monolingual Data in Non-Autoregressive Translation', 'ar': 'أسئلة رائعة وأين يمكن العثور عليها: FairytaleQA - مجموعة بيانات أصيلة للفهم السردي', 'pt': 'Perguntas fantásticas e onde encontrá-las: FairytaleQA - um conjunto de dados autêntico para compreensão narrativa', 'es': 'Preguntas fantásticas y dónde encontrarlas: FairyTaleQA: un conjunto de datos auténtico para la comprensión narrativa', 'fr': 'Questions fantastiques et où les trouver\xa0: FairyTaleqa — Un jeu de données authentique pour la compréhension narrative', 'ja': '素晴らしい質問とそれらを見つける場所： FairytaleQA -ナラティブ理解のための本物のデータセット', 'zh': '奇问何处得,童话QA - 叙事真集', 'ru': 'Фантастические вопросы и где их найти: FairytaleQA - аутентичный набор данных для понимания повествования', 'hi': 'शानदार प्रश्न और उन्हें कहां खोजें: कहानीQA - कथा समझ के लिए एक प्रामाणिक डेटासेट', 'ga': 'Ceisteanna Sármhaithe agus Cá háit a bhfaighidh siad iad: FairytaleQA -- Tacar Sonraí Barántúla le haghaidh Tuisceana ar Narrative', 'ka': 'Fantastic Questions and Where to Find them: FairytaleQA -- Authentication Data Database for Narrative Comprehension', 'el': 'Φανταστικές ερωτήσεις και πού να τις βρείτε: Παραμυθικό Ένα αυθεντικό σύνολο δεδομένων για αφηγητική κατανόηση', 'hu': 'Fantasztikus kérdések és hol találjuk meg őket: FairytaleQA -- hiteles adatkészlet a narratív megértéshez', 'it': 'Domande fantastiche e dove trovarle: FairytaleQA -- un set di dati autentico per la comprensione narrativa', 'kk': 'Фантастикалық сұрақтар және оларды қайда табу: FairytaleQA -- Нарративті сұрақтар үшін аутентификация деректер бағдарламасы', 'lt': 'Fantastiniai klausimai ir kur juos rasti: FairytaleQA -- Authentic Dataset for Narrative Comprehension', 'mk': 'Fantastic Questions and Where to Find Them: FairytaleQA -- An Authentic Dataset for Narrative Comprehension', 'ms': 'Soalan Fantastik dan Mana Cari Mereka: FairytaleQA -- Satu Set Data Authentic untuk Pemahaman Narratif', 'mt': "Mistoqsijiet Fantastiċi u Fejn Issibuhom: FairytaleQA -- Sett ta' Dejta Awtentiku għal Komprensjoni Narrattiva", 'mn': 'Гайхалтай асуултууд, тэднийг хаана олох вэ: FairytaleQA -- Найралтай судалгааны автомат', 'ml': 'ക്യൂഎവിടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d: ഫെയിറ്റലിറ്റിക്ക്QA - നാറാറിവിന്റെ പുതുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആധികാ', 'no': 'Fantastiske spørsmål og kor dei skal finna: FairytaleQA -- En autentiseringsdatabasen for narrative komprehensing', 'ro': 'Întrebări fantastice și unde să le găsești: FairytaleQA - un set de date autentic pentru înțelegerea narativă', 'pl': 'Fantastyczne pytania i gdzie je znaleźć: FairytaleQA\\Autentyczny zestaw danych do zrozumienia narracji', 'sr': 'Fantastična pitanja i gde da ih pronađemo: FairytaleQA -- autentični datum za narrativnu kompresiju', 'so': 'Fantastic Questions and Where to Find Them: FairytaleQA -- An Authentic Dataset for Narrative Comprehension', 'sv': 'Fantastiska frågor och var man hittar dem: FairytaleQA – ett autentiskt dataset för berättande förståelse', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ කොහෙද එයාලව හොයාගන්නේ: වැරැද්දQA -- වැරැද්දක් සම්ප්\u200dරශ්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න දත්ත', 'ta': 'கேள்விகள் மற்றும் அவர்களை எங்கே கண்டுபிடி', 'ur': 'عجیب سوال اور ان کو کہاں پائیں: FairytaleQA -- ناراریٹی کمپرس کے لئے اثبات دیتا ہے', 'uz': 'Fantastic Questions and Where to Find Them: FairytaleQA -- An Authentic Dataset for Narrative Comprehension', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi tuyệt vời và tìm kiếm ở đâu: người thi mã số', 'bg': 'Фантастични въпроси и къде да ги намерим: Истински набор от данни за разбиране на разказите', 'da': 'Fantastiske spørgsmål og hvor man kan finde dem: FairytaleQA -- Et autentisk datasæt til fortælling forståelse', 'nl': 'Fantastische vragen en waar ze te vinden zijn: sprookjesQAÂŪ Authentieke dataset voor narratief begrip', 'hr': 'Fantastična pitanja i gdje ih pronaći: FairytaleQA -- autentična datoteka za narkotičnu kompresiju', 'id': 'Pertanyaan Fantastik dan Dimana Menemukannya: FairytaleQA -- Sebuah Set Data Authentic untuk Pemahaman Narratif', 'de': 'Fantastische Fragen und wo sie zu finden sind: Mﾃ､rchenQA^ Authentischer Datensatz fﾃｼr narratives Verstﾃ､ndnis', 'ko': '기묘한 질문과 어디서 찾을 수 있는지: 동화 퀴즈 - 서사 이해의 진실한 데이터 집합', 'fa': 'سؤال فوق العاده و کجا پیداشون کنیم: FairytaleQA -- یک داده شناسایی برای تأکید مصنوعی', 'tr': 'QA -- An Authentic Dataset for Narrative Comprehension', 'sw': 'Maswali mazuri na kutafuta wapi: Kuzungumza ukweli', 'sq': "Pyetje fantastike dhe ku t'i gjejmë: FairytaleQA -- Një bazë të dhënash autentike për kuptimin narrativ", 'af': 'Fantastiese vrae en waar om hulle te soek: MislukkiQA -- 芒聙聶n Geldigheidsdata vir narrative komprehensie', 'am': 'QA - An Authentic Dataset for Narrative Completion', 'hy': 'Հրաշալի հարցեր և որտե՞ղ գտնել դրանք. ՖերատալեյQA -- Պատմելու ընկալության իրական տվյալների համակարգը', 'az': 'Fantastic Questions and Where to Find them: FairytaleQA -- An Authentication Data Set for Narrative Comprehension', 'bn': 'চমৎকার প্রশ্ন এবং তাদের কোথায় খুঁজে পাওয়া যাবে: ফেয়ারিটালিকা', 'bs': 'Fantastična pitanja i gdje ih pronaći: FairytaleQA -- autentični datum za narkotičnu kompresiju', 'ca': 'Preguntes fantàstiques i on trobar-los: FairytaleQA -- Un conjunt de dades autèntic per a la comprensió narrativa', 'cs': 'Fantastické otázky a kde je najít: Pohádková sada autentických dat pro narativní porozumění', 'fi': 'Fantastisia kysymyksiä ja mistä niitä löytää: FairytaleQA -- Authentic Dataset for Narrative Compreension', 'et': 'Fantastilised küsimused ja kust neid leida: FairytaleQA - autentne andmekogum jutustuse arusaamiseks', 'ha': 'QA - An daidaita Database for Narrative Comprehension', 'sk': 'Fantastična vprašanja in kje jih najti: Pravljica QA -- pristni nabor podatkov za pripovedno razumevanje', 'he': 'שאלות נפלאות ואיפה למצוא אותן: FairytaleQA -- קבוצת נתונים אמיתית להבינה נארטיבית', 'bo': 'Fantastic Questions and Where to Find Them: FairytaleQA -- An Authentication Data for Narrative Comprehension', 'jv': 'structural navigation'}
{'en': 'Knowledge distillation (KD) is the preliminary step for training non-autoregressive translation (NAT) models, which eases the training of NAT models at the cost of losing important information for translating low-frequency words. In this work, we provide an appealing alternative for NAT – monolingual KD, which trains NAT student on external monolingual data with AT teacher trained on the original bilingual data. Monolingual KD is able to transfer both the knowledge of the original bilingual data (implicitly encoded in the trained AT teacher model) and that of the new monolingual data to the NAT student model. Extensive experiments on eight WMT benchmarks over two advanced NAT models show that monolingual KD consistently outperforms the standard KD by improving low-frequency word translation, without introducing any computational cost. Monolingual KD enjoys desirable expandability, which can be further enhanced (when given more computational budget) by combining with the standard KD, a reverse monolingual KD, or enlarging the scale of monolingual data. Extensive analyses demonstrate that these techniques can be used together profitably to further recall the useful information lost in the standard KD. Encouragingly, combining with standard KD, our approach achieves 30.4 and 34.1 BLEU points on the WMT14 English-German and German-English datasets, respectively. Our code and trained models are freely available at https://github.com/alphadl/RLFW-NAT.mono.', 'ar': 'تعد الإجابة عن الأسئلة (QA) وسيلة أساسية لتسهيل تقييم وتدريب مهارات الفهم السردي لكل من الآلات والأطفال الصغار ، ومع ذلك هناك ندرة في مجموعات بيانات ضمان الجودة عالية الجودة المصممة بعناية لخدمة هذا الغرض. على وجه الخصوص ، نادرًا ما تميز مجموعات البيانات الحالية مهارات القراءة الدقيقة ، مثل فهم عناصر السرد المختلفة. بالاعتماد على أبحاث تعليم القراءة ، نقدم FairytaleQA ، وهي مجموعة بيانات تركز على الفهم السردي لرياض الأطفال لطلاب الصف الثامن. تم إعداد FairytaleQA بواسطة خبراء تربويين استنادًا إلى إطار نظري قائم على الأدلة ، ويتكون من 10580 سؤالًا صريحًا وضمنيًا مستمدة من 278 قصة صديقة للأطفال ، تغطي سبعة أنواع من عناصر السرد أو العلاقات. تعتبر مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا ذات قيمة من شقين: أولاً ، قمنا بتشغيل نماذج ضمان الجودة الحالية على مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا وأكدنا أن هذا التعليق التوضيحي يساعد في تقييم مهارات التعلم الدقيقة للنماذج. ثانيًا ، تدعم مجموعة البيانات مهمة إنشاء الأسئلة (QG) في مجال التعليم. من خلال المقارنة مع نماذج QG ، نظهر أن نموذج QG المدرب على FairytaleQA قادر على طرح أسئلة عالية الجودة وأكثر تنوعًا.', 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas (QA) es un medio fundamental para facilitar la evaluación y el entrenamiento de las habilidades de comprensión narrativa tanto para las máquinas como para los niños pequeños, pero hay escasez de conjuntos de datos de control de calidad de alta calidad cuidadosamente diseñados para cumplir con este propósito. En particular, los conjuntos de datos existentes rara vez distinguen las habilidades de lectura minuciosas, como la comprensión de diversos elementos narrativos. Basándonos en la investigación sobre educación lectora, presentamos FairyTaleQA, un conjunto de datos que se centra en la comprensión narrativa de los estudiantes de jardín de infantes para estudiantes de octavo grado. Generada por expertos en educación basada en un marco teórico basado en la evidencia, FairyTaleQA consta de 10.580 preguntas explícitas e implícitas derivadas de 278 historias para niños, que cubren siete tipos de elementos narrativos o relaciones. Nuestro conjunto de datos es valioso en dos aspectos: primero, ejecutamos modelos de control de calidad existentes en nuestro conjunto de datos y confirmamos que esta anotación ayuda a evaluar las habilidades de aprendizaje minuciosas de los modelos. En segundo lugar, el conjunto de datos admite la tarea de generación de preguntas (QG) en el dominio educativo. A través de la evaluación comparativa con modelos QG, demostramos que el modelo QG capacitado en FairyTaleQA es capaz de hacer preguntas de alta calidad y más diversas.', 'pt': 'A resposta a perguntas (QA) é um meio fundamental para facilitar a avaliação e o treinamento de habilidades de compreensão narrativa para máquinas e crianças pequenas, mas há escassez de conjuntos de dados de QA de alta qualidade cuidadosamente projetados para atender a esse propósito. Em particular, os conjuntos de dados existentes raramente distinguem habilidades de leitura refinadas, como a compreensão de vários elementos narrativos. Com base na pesquisa sobre educação em leitura, apresentamos o FairytaleQA, um conjunto de dados com foco na compreensão narrativa de alunos do jardim de infância ao oitavo ano. Gerado por especialistas educacionais com base em uma estrutura teórica baseada em evidências, FairytaleQA consiste em 10.580 perguntas explícitas e implícitas derivadas de 278 histórias para crianças, abrangendo sete tipos de elementos narrativos ou relações. Nosso conjunto de dados é valioso em duas partes: primeiro, executamos modelos de controle de qualidade existentes em nosso conjunto de dados e confirmamos que essa anotação ajuda a avaliar as habilidades de aprendizado refinadas dos modelos. Em segundo lugar, o conjunto de dados suporta a tarefa de geração de perguntas (QG) no domínio da educação. Por meio de benchmarking com modelos QG, mostramos que o modelo QG treinado em FairytaleQA é capaz de fazer perguntas mais diversificadas e de alta qualidade.', 'fr': "La réponse aux questions (AQ) est un moyen fondamental de faciliter l'évaluation et la formation des compétences de compréhension narrative pour les machines et les jeunes enfants, mais il existe une rareté d'ensembles de données d'assurance qualité de haute qualité soigneusement conçus à cet effet. En particulier, les ensembles de données existants distinguent rarement les compétences de lecture fine, telles que la compréhension de divers éléments narratifs. En nous appuyant sur la recherche sur l'enseignement de la lecture, nous présentons FairyTaleqa, un ensemble de données axé sur la compréhension narrative des élèves de la maternelle à la huitième année. Élaboré par des experts en éducation sur la base d'un cadre théorique fondé sur des preuves, FairyTaleqa comprend 10 580 questions explicites et implicites dérivées de 278 histoires adaptées aux enfants, couvrant sept types d'éléments narratifs ou de relations. Notre jeu de données est précieux à deux titres\xa0: tout d'abord, nous avons exécuté des modèles d'assurance qualité existants sur notre jeu de données et avons confirmé que cette annotation aide à évaluer les compétences d'apprentissage précises des modèles. Ensuite, l'ensemble de données prend en charge la tâche de génération de questions (QG) dans le domaine de l'éducation. Grâce à l'analyse comparative avec les modèles QG, nous montrons que le modèle QG formé sur FairyTaleqa est capable de poser des questions de haute qualité et plus diverses.", 'zh': '问答者(QA)趣机器与幼子评培训叙事解能之本术,而阙其精心设计者高质量QA数集。 今世数集,罕有区别细粒度者,如叙事元素之解。 鉴观教究,介于童话QA,此专注幼儿园至八年级叙事之数集也。 由教家基循证理框架成,FairytaleQA由278童好10,580明隐成,涵盖七事元素。 吾数集在两端有价:先于数集上行见QA模形,并认此注有助于评模者细粒度学能。 其次,数集教育领域成(QG)务。 试QG以准之,明于FairytaleQA之QG能发高质量更多样化之问。', 'ja': '質疑応答（ QA ）は、機械と幼児の両方のための物語理解スキルの評価とトレーニングを促進するための基本的な手段ですが、この目的を達成するために慎重に設計された質の高いQAデータセットは希少です。 特に、既存のデータセットは、さまざまな物語的要素の理解など、細かい読み取りスキルを区別することはほとんどありません。 読書教育研究を参考に、幼稚園から8年生の物語理解に焦点を当てたデータセット「FairytaleQA」を紹介します。 エビデンスに基づく理論的枠組みに基づいた教育専門家によって生成されたFairytaleQAは、278の子供向けストーリーから派生した10,580の明示的で暗黙的な質問で構成されており、7種類の物語要素または関係をカバーしています。 私たちのデータセットは2つの面で価値があります。まず、データセット上の既存のQAモデルを実行し、この注釈がモデルの細かい学習スキルを評価するのに役立つことを確認しました。 第二に、データセットは教育ドメインでの質問生成（ QG ）タスクをサポートします。 QGモデルとのベンチマークを通じて、FairytaleQAでトレーニングされたQGモデルは、高品質でより多様な質問をすることができます。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) मशीनों और छोटे बच्चों दोनों के लिए कथा समझ कौशल के मूल्यांकन और प्रशिक्षण को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए एक मौलिक साधन है, फिर भी इस उद्देश्य को पूरा करने के लिए सावधानीपूर्वक डिज़ाइन किए गए उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले क्यूए डेटासेट की कमी है। विशेष रूप से, मौजूदा डेटासेट शायद ही कभी ठीक-ठाक पढ़ने के कौशल को अलग करते हैं, जैसे कि अलग-अलग कथा तत्वों की समझ। पढ़ने की शिक्षा अनुसंधान पर ड्राइंग, हम FairytaleQA पेश करते हैं, जो आठवीं कक्षा के छात्रों के लिए किंडरगार्टन की कथा समझ पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने वाला डेटासेट है। एक साक्ष्य-आधारित सैद्धांतिक ढांचे के आधार पर शैक्षिक विशेषज्ञों द्वारा उत्पन्न, परी कथाक्यूए में 278 बच्चों के अनुकूल कहानियों से व्युत्पन्न 10,580 स्पष्ट और अंतर्निहित प्रश्न शामिल हैं, जो सात प्रकार के कथा तत्वों या संबंधों को कवर करते हैं। हमारा डेटासेट दो सिलवटों में मूल्यवान है: सबसे पहले, हमने अपने डेटासेट पर मौजूदा क्यूए मॉडल चलाए और पुष्टि की कि यह एनोटेशन मॉडल के ठीक-ठीक सीखने के कौशल का आकलन करने में मदद करता है। दूसरा, डेटासेट शिक्षा डोमेन में प्रश्न जनरेशन (क्यूजी) कार्य का समर्थन करता है। क्यूजी मॉडल के साथ बेंचमार्किंग के माध्यम से, हम दिखाते हैं कि परी कथाक्यूए पर प्रशिक्षित क्यूजी मॉडल उच्च गुणवत्ता और अधिक विविध प्रश्न पूछने में सक्षम है।', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы (QA) являются основным средством для облегчения оценки и обучения навыкам понимания повествования как для машин, так и для маленьких детей, однако существует нехватка высококачественных наборов данных QA, тщательно разработанных для этой цели. В частности, существующие наборы данных редко отличают мелкозернистые навыки чтения, такие как понимание различных элементов повествования. Основываясь на исследовании образования чтения, мы представляем FairytaleQA, набор данных, сосредоточенный на понимании детских садов учениками восьмого класса. Созданная экспертами в области образования на основе теоретической основы, основанной на фактических данных, FairytaleQA состоит из 10 580 явных и неявных вопросов, полученных из 278 дружественных детям историй, охватывающих семь типов повествовательных элементов или отношений. Наш набор данных является ценным в двух отношениях: во-первых, мы провели анализ существующих моделей QA на нашем наборе данных и подтвердили, что эта аннотация помогает оценить тонкозернистые навыки обучения моделей. Во-вторых, набор данных поддерживает задачу генерации вопросов (QG) в области образования. Сравнительный анализ с моделями QG показывает, что обученная на FairytaleQA модель QG способна задавать высококачественные и более разнообразные вопросы.', 'ga': 'Is modh bunúsach é freagra ceisteanna (QA) chun measúnú agus oiliúint scileanna tuisceana a éascú do mheaisíní agus do leanaí óga araon, ach tá ganntanas tacair sonraí QA ardchaighdeáin atá deartha go cúramach chun freastal ar an gcuspóir seo. Go háirithe, is annamh a dhéanann tacair shonraí atá ann cheana féin idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir scileanna léitheoireachta mionghnéitheacha, cosúil le tuiscint ar ghnéithe éagsúla insinte. Ag tarraingt ar an taighde ar oideachas léitheoireachta, tugaimid isteach FairytaleQA, tacar sonraí a dhíríonn ar thuiscint ar naíscoil do dhaltaí san ochtú grád. Arna ghiniúint ag saineolaithe oideachais bunaithe ar chreat teoiriciúil atá bunaithe ar fhianaise, tá FairytaleQA comhdhéanta de 10,580 ceist shoiléir agus intuigthe a dhíorthaítear ó 278 scéal a oireann do leanaí, a chlúdaíonn seacht gcineál eilimint nó caidrimh insinte. Tá dhá shraith luachmhar ag ár dtacar sonraí: Ar an gcéad dul síos, ritheamar samhlacha QA reatha ar ár dtacar sonraí agus dheimhnigh muid go gcabhraíonn an nóta seo le measúnú a dhéanamh ar scileanna foghlama mionghnéitheacha na samhlacha. Ar an dara dul síos, tacaíonn an tacar sonraí le tasc giniúna ceisteanna (QG) i réimse an oideachais. Trí thagarmharcáil le samhlacha QG, léirímid go bhfuil an tsamhail QG atá oilte ar FairytaleQA in ann ceisteanna ardcháilíochta agus níos éagsúla a chur.', 'hu': 'A kérdésre adott válasz (QA) alapvető eszköz annak érdekében, hogy megkönnyítsük a narratív értékelési készségek értékelését és képzését mind a gépek, mind a kisgyermekek számára, ugyanakkor hiányzik a kiváló minőségű minőségi adatkészlet, amelyet gondosan erre a célra terveztek. Különösen a meglévő adatkészletek ritkán különböztetik meg a finomszemcsés olvasási készségeket, mint például a különböző narratív elemek megértése. Az olvasónevelési kutatásokra támaszkodva bemutatjuk a nyolcadikos diákoknak az óvodai elbeszélő megértésre összpontosító FairytaleQA adatkészletet. Az oktatási szakemberek által egy bizonyítékokon alapuló elméleti keretrendszer alapján generált FairytaleQA 278 gyermekbarát történetből származó, 10 580 explicit és implicit kérdésből áll, amelyek hét típusú narratív elemet vagy kapcsolatot fednek fel. Adatkészletünk két darabban értékes: Először is futtattuk le adatkészletünkön a meglévő minőségbiztosítási modelleket, és megerősítettük, hogy ez a megjegyzés segít felmérni a modellek finom szemű tanulási készségeit. Másodszor, az adatkészlet támogatja a kérdések generálását (QG) feladatokat az oktatási területen. A QG modellek teljesítményértékelésével megmutatjuk, hogy a FairytaleQA-n képzett QG modell képes kiváló minőségű és sokszínűbb kérdéseket feltenni.', 'el': 'Η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις (QA) είναι ένα θεμελιώδες μέσο για τη διευκόλυνση της αξιολόγησης και της κατάρτισης δεξιοτήτων αφηγηματικής κατανόησης τόσο για μηχανές όσο και για μικρά παιδιά, ωστόσο υπάρχει έλλειψη υψηλής ποιότητας συνόλων δεδομένων QA σχεδιασμένων προσεκτικά για να εξυπηρετήσουν αυτόν τον σκοπό. Ειδικότερα, τα υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων σπάνια διακρίνουν λεπτόκοκκες δεξιότητες ανάγνωσης, όπως η κατανόηση ποικίλων αφηγηματικών στοιχείων. Βασιζόμενοι στην έρευνα της αναγνωστικής εκπαίδευσης, εισάγουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που επικεντρώνεται στην αφηγηματική κατανόηση του νηπιαγωγείου σε μαθητές της 8ης δημοτικού. Δημιουργήθηκε από εκπαιδευτικούς εμπειρογνώμονες με βάση ένα τεκμηριωμένο θεωρητικό πλαίσιο, το παραμύθι αποτελείται από 10,580 ρητά και έμμεσα ερωτήματα που προέρχονται από 278 παιδικές ιστορίες, καλύπτοντας επτά τύπους αφηγηματικών στοιχείων ή σχέσεων. Το σύνολο δεδομένων μας είναι πολύτιμο σε δύο πτυχές: Πρώτον, εκτελέσαμε υπάρχοντα μοντέλα QS στο σύνολο δεδομένων μας και επιβεβαιώσαμε ότι αυτή η παρατήρηση βοηθά στην αξιολόγηση των λεπτομερών μαθησιακών δεξιοτήτων των μοντέλων. Δεύτερον, το σύνολο δεδομένων υποστηρίζει την εργασία δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων στον τομέα της εκπαίδευσης. Μέσω συγκριτικής αξιολόγησης με μοντέλα καταδεικνύουμε ότι το μοντέλο QG εκπαιδευμένο στο FairytaleQA είναι ικανό να θέσει υψηλής ποιότητας και πιο ποικίλες ερωτήσεις.', 'ka': 'კითხვების პასუხი (QA) არის ფუნდამეტური მონაცემები, რომელიც მაქანების და მხარე ბავშვებისთვის განსაკუთრების შესაძლებლობა და განაკუთრების შესაძლებლობა, მაგრამ არსებობს უფრო მარტივი QA მონაცემების განსაკუთრებით, არსებობს მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის მეცნიერება, როგორც განსხვავებული ისტორიების განსხვავება. ჩვენ კითხვის განსწავლების განსწავლების შესახებ ჩვენ FairytaleQA-ს ჩვენებთ, მონაცემების კონსტურაცია, რომელიც ბავშვების განსწავლებისთვის 8 წლის სტუდენტებისთვის განსწავლებ განსწავლებელი ექსპერტიები, რომლებიც აღმოწმებით თეორეტიკური ფრამეტზე ბაზიან, ფარიtaleQA იყოს 10 580 განსწავლებელი და იმპლიციტიური კითხვები, რომლებიც 278 ბავშვებისთვის მეგობრებელი ისტორიებიდან დაიწ ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია ორი კონფიგურაციში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია: პირველი, ჩვენ ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია QA მოდელების ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გა მეორე, მონაცემების საქაღალდე კითხვების (QG) საქაღალდე განათლების დიომინში. QG მოდელისთვის ბანქმარიკაციით ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ QG მოდელის შესწავლობა FairytaleQA-ზე შეუძლებელია უფრო მეტი კითხვების შესაძლებლობა.', 'it': "La risposta alle domande (QA) è un mezzo fondamentale per facilitare la valutazione e la formazione delle capacità di comprensione narrativa sia per le macchine che per i bambini piccoli, eppure vi è scarsità di set di dati QA di alta qualità progettati con cura per servire questo scopo. In particolare, i dataset esistenti raramente distinguono abilità di lettura a grana fine, come la comprensione di diversi elementi narrativi. Attingendo alla ricerca sull'educazione alla lettura, introduciamo FairytaleQA, un dataset incentrato sulla comprensione narrativa dell'asilo per gli studenti della terza media. Generato da esperti educativi basati su un framework teorico basato sull'evidenza, FairytaleQA consiste in 10.580 domande esplicite e implicite derivate da 278 storie a misura di bambini, che coprono sette tipi di elementi narrativi o relazioni. Il nostro set di dati è prezioso in due pieghe: in primo luogo, abbiamo eseguito modelli di QA esistenti sul nostro set di dati e confermato che questa annotazione aiuta a valutare le capacità di apprendimento fine dei modelli. In secondo luogo, il dataset supporta l'attività di generazione delle domande (QG) nel settore dell'istruzione. Attraverso il benchmarking con i modelli QG, dimostriamo che il modello QG addestrato su FairytaleQA è in grado di porre domande di alta qualità e più diverse.", 'lt': 'Klausimų atsakymas yra pagrindinė priemonė palengvinti tiek mašinų, tiek mažų vaikų narracinio supratimo įgūdžių vertinimą ir mokymą, tačiau nėra aukštos kokybės QA duomenų rinkinių, atidžiai sukurtų šiam tikslui įgyvendinti. Visų pirma esamuose duomenų rinkiniuose retai skiriami smulkiai apdoroti skaitymo įgūdžiai, pavyzdžiui, skirtingų narracinių elementų supratimas. Remdamiesi skaitymo švietimo moksliniais tyrimais, pristatysime FairytaleQA, duomenų rinkinį, kuriame daugiausia dėmesio skiriama vaikų sodo narraciniam supratimui a štuntojo lygio studentams. Generated by educational experts based on an evidence-based theoretical framework, FairytaleQA consists of 10,580 explicit and implicit questions derived from 278 children-friendly stories, covering seven types of narrative elements or relations.  Mūsų duomenų rinkinys yra vertingas dviem dalimis: pirma, mes atlikome esamus QA modelius savo duomenų rinkinyje ir patvirtinome, kad ši anotacija padeda įvertinti modelių puikius mokymosi įgūdžius. Antra, duomenų rinkinys remia klausimų kūrimo užduotį švietimo srityje. Atliekant QG modelių lyginamąją analizę, parodome, kad FairytaleQA parengtas QG model is gali užduoti aukštos kokybės ir įvairesnius klausimus.', 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру (QA) деген негізгі мәлімет - машиналар мен жас балалар үшін жұмыс түсініктерді оқу және оқу мүмкіндіктерін оқу және оқу үшін, бірақ QA деректер қорларының жоғары сапасы жоғары жоғары Әсіресе, бар деректер жиындары әртүрлі түсінікті элементтердің түсініктемесі сияқты оқу мүмкіндіктерін бір-біріне айырады. Оқу білім зерттеулеріне көмектесіп, FairytaleQA дегенді, балалардың түсініктеріне 8 сынып студенттерге көмектесетін деректер жиынын таңдаймыз. Бірақ білім беру эксперттері дәл теоретикалық фрейміне негізделген, FairytaleQA, 278 балаларға қатысты және қатынастарының жеті түрлері жазылған 10 580 түсінікті және мәліметті сұрақтарды жасайды. Біздің деректер жиынымыз екі қапшықта мәні: біріншіден, біз барлық QA үлгілерін деректер жиынында орындап, бұл жазбалар үлгілердің жақсы оқыту мүмкіндіктерін оқу үшін көмектесетін де Екіншіден, деректер қоры білім доменінде сұрақ құру (QG) тапсырмасын қолдайды. QG үлгілерімен бақылау арқылы, FairytaleQA бақылаған QG үлгісі жоғары сапатты және әртүрлі сұрақтарды сұрау мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Одговорите на прашањата (QA) се фундаментални средства за олеснување на проценката и обуката на способностите за раскажување за машините и малите деца, но постои недостаток на висококвалитетни QA податоци внимателно дизајнирани за да ја служат оваа цел. Посебно, постоечките податоци ретко ги разликуваат фините читателски вештини, како што е разбирањето на различните раскажувачки елементи. Користејќи се на истражувањето за образование за читање, ние го претставуваме FairytaleQA, податок кој се фокусира на приказната за разбирање на градината на деца до студенти од осмо одделение. Генерирани од образовни експерти базирани на теоретска рамка базирана на докази, FairytaleQA се состои од 10.580 експлицитни и имплицитни прашања изведени од 278 приказни за деца, кои покриваат седум видови на приказни или односи. Нашиот компјутер на податоци е вреден во две факти: Прво, ги проверивме постоечките модели на QA на нашиот компјутер и потврдивме дека оваа анотација помага во проценката на фините научни вештини на моделите. Второ, податоците ја поддржуваат задачата за генерација на прашања (QG) во областа на образованието. Со benchmarking со QG модели покажуваме дека QG моделот обучен на FairytaleQA е способен да поставува висококвалитетни и поразлични прашања.', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan (QA) adalah cara asas untuk memudahkan penilaian dan latihan kemampuan pemahaman cerita untuk mesin dan kanak-kanak muda, namun terdapat kekurangan set data QA berkualiti tinggi yang direka dengan hati-hati untuk melayani tujuan ini. In particular, existing datasets rarely distinguish fine-grained reading skills, such as the understanding of varying narrative elements.  Melukis kajian pendidikan pembacaan, kami memperkenalkan FairytaleQA, set data yang fokus pada pemahaman cerita kebun kanak-kanak kepada pelajar kelas 8. Dijana oleh ahli pendidikan berdasarkan kerangka teori berdasarkan bukti, FairytaleQA terdiri dari 10,580 soalan eksplicit dan implicit yang berasal dari 278 cerita ramah kanak-kanak, meliputi tujuh jenis unsur cerita atau hubungan. Set data kita berharga dalam dua kali: Pertama, kami menjalankan model QA yang wujud pada set data kami dan mengesahkan bahawa anotasi ini membantu menilai kemampuan belajar yang baik model. Kedua, set data menyokong tugas generasi soalan (QG) dalam domain pendidikan. Melalui benchmarking dengan model QG, kami menunjukkan bahawa model QG dilatih pada FairytaleQA mampu menanyakan soalan kualiti tinggi dan lebih berbeza.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം (ക്യൂഎ) എന്നത് യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ചെറുപ്പക്കാര്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുവാനും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു means്ക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നിലവിലുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന കഴിവുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നത്  വായിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്\u200dറെ പരിശോധന നടത്തുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഫെയ്രിസ്റ്റെയില്\u200d ക്യൂഎട്ട് ഗ്രാഡ്സിലേക് Generated by educational experts based on an evidence-based theoretical framework, FairytaleQA consists of 10,580 explicit and implicit questions derived from 278 children-friendly stories, covering seven types of narrative elements or relations.  നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് രണ്ടു ഫോള്\u200dഡറില്\u200d വിലയുള്ളതാണ്: ആദ്യം, നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള QA മോഡല്\u200d ഓടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന രണ്ടാമതായി, വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ ഡോമെയിനിലെ ചോദ്യ തലമുറയില്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന ക്യൂ ജി മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ബെന്\u200dമെങ്കിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു ഫെയ്രിയിട്ടല്\u200d ക്യൂജി മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) hija mezz fundamentali biex tiġi ffaċilitata l-valutazzjoni u t-taħriġ ta’ ħiliet ta’ komprensjoni narrattiva kemm għall-magni kif ukoll għat-tfal żgħar, iżda hemm skarsezza ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ QA ta’ kwalità għolja mfassla b’attenzjoni biex iservu dan l-għan. B’mod partikolari, settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti rarament jiddistingwu l-ħiliet tal-qari fini, bħall-fehim ta’ elementi narrattivi varji. Abbażi tar-riċerka dwar l-edukazzjoni fil-qari, a ħna nintroduċu FairytaleQA, sett ta’ dejta li jiffoka fuq il-komprensjoni narrattiva tal-kindergarten għal studenti tat-tmien grad. Ġenerat minn esperti edukattivi bbażati fuq qafas teoretiku bbażat fuq evidenza, FairytaleQA tikkonsisti f’10 580 mistoqsija espliċita u impliċita derivati minn 278 storja favur it-tfal, li tkopri seba’ tipi ta’ elementi jew relazzjonijiet narrattivi. Is-sett tad-dejta tagħna huwa ta’ valur f’żewġ darbiet: L-ewwel nett, aħna wettaqna mudelli ta’ QA eżistenti fuq is-sett tad-dejta tagħna u kkonfermajna li din l-annotazzjoni tgħin biex jiġu vvalutati l-ħiliet ta’ tagħlim irfinat tal-mudelli. It-tieni nett, is-sett tad-dejta jappoġġja l-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet (QG) fil-qasam tal-edukazzjoni. Permezz ta’ benchmarking mal-mudelli QG, nagħmlu evidenza li l-mudell QG imħarreġ fuq FairytaleQA huwa kapaċi li jistaqsi mistoqsijiet ta’ kwalità għolja u aktar diversifikati.', 'mn': 'Оюутнуудын хариулт (QA) бол машин болон залуу хүүхдүүдэд өгөгдлийн сангуудын үндсэн арга юм. Гэхдээ энэ зорилго ашиглах зорилго дээр чанартай QA өгөгдлийн сангуудын бага бага байдаг. Ялангуяа, суурилсан өгөгдлийн сангууд өөр төрлийн түүх элементүүдийг ойлгох мэт сайхан унших чадварыг ховор ялгаалж байдаг. Бид унших боловсролын судалгааны тулд FairytaleQA-г танилцуулж байна. Хүүхдүүдийн түүх ойлголтын тухай 8-сын оюутнуудад анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Боловсролын мэргэжилтнүүд нь баталгаатай теоретик хэлбэрээр суурилсан, FairytaleQA нь 278 хүүхдүүдийн найзуудтай түүхийн тулд 10,580 тодорхой, нээлттэй асуулт байдаг. Бидний өгөгдлийн санг хоёр дахин үнэ цэнэтэй: Эхлээд бид өгөгдлийн санд суурилсан QA моделуудыг ашиглаж, энэ загварын сайхан суралцах чадварыг үнэлэхэд тусалдаг гэдгийг баталсан. Хоёрдугаарт, өгөгдлийн сангууд боловсролын талаар асуулт төрүүлэх (QG) ажлыг дэмжиж байна. QG загваруудыг банкварчлахад, FairytaleQA-д сургалтын QG загвар нь өндөр чанартай, олон төрлийн асуулт асууж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Odpowiadanie na pytania (QA) jest podstawowym środkiem ułatwiającym ocenę i szkolenie umiejętności zrozumienia narracji zarówno maszynom, jak i małym dzieciom, jednak brakuje wysokiej jakości zbiorów danych dotyczących jakości starannie zaprojektowanych w tym celu. W szczególności istniejące zbiory danych rzadko odróżniają drobnoziarniste umiejętności czytania, takie jak zrozumienie różnych elementów narracji. Opierając się na badaniach edukacji czytelniczej, wprowadzamy FairytaleQA, zbiór danych skupiający się na narracyjnym zrozumieniu przedszkola studentom ósmej klasy. Wygenerowany przez ekspertów edukacyjnych w oparciu o oparte na dowodach ramy teoretyczne FairytaleQA składa się z 10,580 wyraźnych i domyślnych pytań wywodzących się z 278 opowieści przyjaznych dzieciom, obejmujących siedem rodzajów elementów narracji lub relacji. Nasz zestaw danych jest wartościowy w dwóch aspektach: Po pierwsze, uruchomiliśmy istniejące modele QA na naszym zestawie danych i potwierdziliśmy, że adnotacja ta pomaga ocenić precyzyjne umiejętności uczenia się modeli. Po drugie, zestaw danych obsługuje zadanie generowania pytań (QG) w dziedzinie edukacji. Poprzez porównanie z modelami QG pokazujemy, że model QG trenowany na FairytaleQA jest w stanie zadać wysokiej jakości i bardziej zróżnicowane pytania.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări (QA) este un mijloc fundamental de a facilita evaluarea și formarea abilităților de înțelegere narativă atât pentru mașini, cât și pentru copii mici, cu toate acestea există un deficit de seturi de date QA de înaltă calitate concepute cu atenție pentru a servi acest scop. În special, seturile de date existente rareori disting abilitățile de citire fină, cum ar fi înțelegerea diferitelor elemente narative. Pornind de la cercetarea educației lecturii, introducem FairytaleQA, un set de date axat pe înțelegerea narativă a grădiniței pentru elevii clasei a opta. Generat de experți educaționali bazat pe un cadru teoretic bazat pe dovezi, FairytaleQA constă în 10.580 de întrebări explicite și implicite derivate din 278 de povești prietenoase cu copiii, acoperind șapte tipuri de elemente narative sau relații. Setul nostru de date este valoros în două variante: în primul rând, am rulat modele QA existente pe setul nostru de date și am confirmat că această adnotare ajută la evaluarea abilităților de învățare fine ale modelelor. În al doilea rând, setul de date acceptă sarcina de generare a întrebărilor (QG) în domeniul educației. Prin benchmarking cu modele QG, demonstrăm că modelul QG instruit pe FairytaleQA este capabil să pună întrebări de înaltă calitate și mai diverse.', 'no': 'Spørsmålssvar (QA) er ein grunnleggjande måte å letta vurdering og opplæring av historiske underforståkingsverdiar for både maskiner og unge barn, men det er nokre feil av høg kvalitet QA-datasett forsiktig designert for å gjere denne målet. Dei eksisterande datasetta er ofte forskjellig å forstå fin-kornerte lesingskvalitetar, slik som forståelse av forskjellige historiske elementar. Teiknar vi på utdannelsesforskningen for lesing, introdusere vi FairytaleQA, ein dataset som fokuserer på historisk forståelse av bærgarten til åtte grader. Generert av opplæringsekspertar basert på eit beviserbasert teoretisk rammeverk, er FairytaleQA saman av 10 580 eksplisitt og implisitt spørsmål avhengig frå 278 barnbruk historiar, og dekkar syv typar storatiske elementer eller relasjonar. Datasettet vårt er verdileg i to folder: Først køyrde vi QA-modeller på datasettet våre og stadfestig at denne merkinga hjelper å vurdere innstillingane for læring av modeller. Andre, datasettet støttar oppgåva for å laga spørsmål (QG) i utdannelsesdomenet. Gjennom benchmarking med QG-modeller viser vi at QG-modellen trent på FairytaleQA er i stand til å spørja høg kvalitet og fleire forskjellige spørsmål.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na pitanja (QA) je osnovno sredstvo za olakšanje procjene i obuke vještina priče o razumijevanju za mašine i mlade djece, a ipak nema nedostatka visokokvalitetnih podataka QA-a koji su pažljivo dizajnirani da služe ovu svrhu. Posebno, postojeće podaci rijetko razlikuju kvalitete čitanja, poput razumevanja različitih priče. Prema istraživanju obrazovanja čitanja, predstavljamo FairytaleQA, set podataka koji se fokusira na priču o razumijevanju djetinjskog artena do studenata osmog razreda. Generirali su obrazovni stručnjaci na temelju teorijskog okvira na temelju dokaza, FairytaleQA sastoji od 10.580 ekskluzivnih i implicitnih pitanja iz 278 priče o djeci, koje pokrivaju sedam vrsta priče ili odnosa. Naša kompleta podataka je vrijedna u dva puta: prvo, pokrenuli smo postojeće QA modele na našoj kompletu podataka i potvrdili da ova annotacija pomaže da proceni dobre vještine učenja modela. Drugo, komplet podržava zadatak generacije pitanja (QG) u obrazovanju. Kroz benchmarking sa QG modelima pokazujemo da je QG model obučen na FairytaleQA sposoban da postavlja visoke kvalitete i različite pitanja.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර (QA) කියන්නේ මූලික විද්\u200dයාවක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂයෙන්, තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ දත්ත සටහන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් කතාවක් අනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් කතාවක කියවන්න පුද්ගලික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අපි Fairy TalQA විස්තර කරනවා, දත්ත සූද්ධානයක් පුද්ගලික පුද්ගලික විද්\u200dයාඥාවක් ගැන අතර සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සාක්ෂික සංවේදනය, Fairy TalQA එක්ක 10,580 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුලෙන් ඉන්නේ කොල්ලෝ අපේ දත්ත සූද්ධානය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: මුලින්ම, අපි තියෙන්නේ QA මොඩේලය අපේ දත්ත සූද්ධානයේ ප්\u200dරමාණය කරලා තියෙනවා ඒ දෙවෙනියි, දත්ත සෙට් ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණය (QG) ව්\u200dයාපෘතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය (ප්\u200dරශ්න QG මොඩේල් එක්ක බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ QG මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් Fairy TalQA එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශ', 'sv': 'Frågeställning (QA) är ett grundläggande sätt att underlätta bedömning och träning av berättande förståelse färdigheter för både maskiner och små barn, men det finns brist på högkvalitativa QA-dataset noggrant utformade för att tjäna detta syfte. Framför allt skiljer befintliga datamängder sällan finkorniga läsfärdigheter, såsom förståelsen av olika narrativa element. Med utgångspunkt i läsundervisningsforskningen introducerar vi FairytaleQA, ett dataset med fokus på berättande förståelse av dagis för åttonde klass elever. FairytaleQA genereras av pedagogiska experter baserat på ett evidensbaserat teoretiskt ramverk och består av 10 580 explicita och implicita frågor som härrör från 278 barnvänliga berättelser, som täcker sju typer av berättande element eller relationer. Vårt dataset är värdefullt i två delar: Först körde vi befintliga QA-modeller på vårt dataset och bekräftade att denna notering hjälper till att bedöma modellernas finkorniga inlärningsförmåga. För det andra stöder datauppsättningen frågegenerering (QG) uppgift inom utbildningsområdet. Genom benchmarking med QG-modeller visar vi att QG-modellen utbildad på FairytaleQA kan ställa högkvalitativa och mer mångsidiga frågor.', 'so': "Suuqashada su'aaladu (QA) waa nooc aasaasi ah in lagu sawiro qiimeynta iyo waxbarashada aqoonta aasaasiga ah ee mashiinadaha iyo dhallinyarada, laakiin waxaa jira laxaad la’aan karo macluumaadka QA-ta oo si taxadar leh loogu talo galay arrintan. Si gaar ah, koobaha macluumaadka joogta si gaar ah ayuu u kala soocaa aqoonta akhrinta oo suurad leh, tusaale ahaan garashada qalabka sheekooyinka kala duduwan. Muujinta waxbarashada akhriska waxaynu soo bandhignaa FairytaleQA, taas oo ah koox macluumaad ah oo ku kalsoonayo qoraalka qoraalka barbaarinta caruurta iyo ardayda fasalka siddeedaad. QA waxaa ka mid ah warqado caddeynta cilmiga ah oo ku saleysan tioretika, FairytaleQA waxaa ka mid ah 10,580 oo cad iyo saameyn cad oo ka soo baxay sheekooyinka saaxiibka caruurta 278, kaas oo ku qoran todobo nooc oo ah taariikhda ama xiriirka. Taariikhdayada macluumaadku waa qiimaan labada foldood: Marka hore, waxaynu ku soconnay qaababka QA ee joogta, waxaana ku xaqiijinaynay in tababarkan ka caawinayo qiimeynta aqoonta waxbarashada saxda ah. Second, shabakada macluumaadku wuxuu kaalmeeyaa danbiyada su’aalaha (QG) goobta waxbarashada. QA wuxuu awoodaa in uu weydiin karo su'aalo badan oo kala duduwan.", 'ta': 'கேள்வி பதில் (QA) என்பது இயந்திரங்கள் மற்றும் சிறுவர்களுக்கும் சிறுவர்களுக்கும் சார்ந்த தொகுதி தொகுதிகளை ஆய்வு மற்றும் பயிற்சியும் ஒரு முக்கியமான வழ குறிப்பிட்டு, இருக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மிகவும் குறைவாகவே சிறப்பு பிடிக்கப்பட்ட படிப்பு திறமைகளை பிரித்துக் க படிக்கும் கல்வி ஆராய்ச்சியை வரையும் வரையில், நாம் பேரிட்டிரிட்டிருக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், சிறுவன்கார் தெளிவான திட்டமைப்பு அடிப்படையிலான கல்விப்பெண்களால் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ள கல்விப்பாளர்களால் பேரிட்டிருக்கும் கேள்விகள் 10,580 வெளிப்படையாகும் மற்றும் வெ எங்கள் தகவல் அமைப்பு இரண்டு அடைவுகளில் மதிப்புள்ளது. முதலில், நாங்கள் இருக்கும் QA மாதிரிகளை எங்கள் தரவுத் தளத்தில் இயக்கி இந்த அறிவிப்பு மாதி இரண்டாவது, தகவல் அமைப்பு கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்திற்கு (QG) பணியை ஆதரிக்கிறது கல்வி தளத்தில். QG மாதிரிகளுடன் பெங்குத்தல் வழியாக, நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் பேரியரிடும் QA மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட QG மாதிரி அதிக தரம் மற்று', 'ur': 'سوال جواب (QA) ایک بنیادی وسیلہ ہے کہ ماشین اور جوان بچوں کے لئے داستان کی تعلیم اور تعلیم کی آزمائش اور تعلیم آسانی کرے، لیکن اس کے لئے اچھی کیفیت کی QA ڈاٹ سٹ کی کمزوری نہیں ہے۔ مخصوصاً موجود ڈاٹ سٹ بہت کم اچھی دانے پڑھنے کی طاقتوں کو متفاوت کرتے ہیں، جیسے مختلف داستانیوں کی سمجھ. پڑھنے کی تحصیلات پر ڈرائیں، ہم FairytaleQA کو پہنچاتے ہیں، ایک ڈاٹ سٹ جو بچھونڈ کے گھوٹ کی تعلیم کے ذریعے آٹھ کلاس کی طالبوں کے لئے منتخب ہوتا ہے. فایریٹیل کیا کے ذریعے 10,580 کھول کھول کھول کر اور مشکل سوالات ہیں جو 278 بچوں کے دوستی کہانیاں سے آئے ہیں، سات طریقے داستان یا رابطہ پر پورے ہیں. ہمارا ڈاٹ سٹ دو دفعہ میں ارزش دار ہے: پہلے ہم اپنے ڈاٹ سٹ پر موجود QA موڈل چلتے ہیں اور تائید کرتے ہیں کہ یہ مضبوط مدل کے مطابق نیک دانے کی تعلیم کی طاقتوں کی آزمائش کی مدد کرتی ہے. دوسرا، ڈاٹ سٹ سوال نسل (QG) کے کام کی مدد کرتا ہے۔ QG موڈل کے ساتھ بنچم مارک کے ذریعہ، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ FairytaleQA پر آموزش کی QG موڈل بہت سی کیفیت اور بہت مختلف سوال پوچھنے کے قابل ہے.', 'uz': "Name Hullas, mavjud maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'qish imkoniyatlarini juda qisqa o'qishni o'zgartirib turadi. Maktabni o'qishni o'qishni tasavvur qilish uchun Biz FairytaleQA, o'sha o'smirlarning eng sakkiz sinf o'quvchilariga o'rganishni o'rganadi. Name Maʼlumotlar sahifasi ikki marta qiymatdir: Birinchida, biz maʼlumotlar sahifadagi QA modellarimizni boshqaramiz va bu taʼminlovchi modellarning yaxshi o'rganish imkoniyatini yordam beradi. Ikkinchi so'zda, maʼlumotlar soʻzni ta'lim domenasidan savol yaratishni qoʻllaydi. QA modellarini QG modellari bilan yordamida, biz Fayltalen QG modelini o'rganish mumkin, yuqori sifatida va ko'proq turli savollarni soʻrashadi.", 'vi': 'Câu trả lời câu hỏi (QA) là một phương tiện cơ bản để dễ dàng đánh giá và đào tạo khả năng thấu hiểu to àn bộ câu chuyện cho cả máy móc và trẻ em, nhưng vẫn còn thiếu những bộ dữ liệu QA chất lượng cao được thiết kế cẩn thận để phục vụ mục đích này. Đặc biệt, các tập tin tồn tại hiếm khi phân biệt kỹ năng đọc sắc mĩ, như là sự hiểu biết các yếu tố cốt truyện khác nhau. Dựa trên nghiên cứu giáo dục đọc, chúng tôi giới thiệu Fairbanks, một tập tin tập trung vào sự thấu hiểu to àn bộ câu chuyện của nhà trẻ cho sinh viên lớp tám. Được tạo ra bởi các chuyên gia giáo dục dựa trên một cơ sở lý thuyết bằng chứng, Fairchild được bao gồm có hàng chục,510,8 các câu hỏi rõ ràng và ngầm có nguồn gốc từ các câu chuyện trẻ em 27, bao gồm bảy loại câu chuyện hoặc quan hệ. Bộ dữ liệu của chúng tôi có giá trị trong hai cột. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi chạy các mô hình cá nhân còn tồn tại trên bộ dữ liệu và xác nhận rằng chú thích này giúp đánh giá kỹ năng học tập. Thứ hai, bộ dữ liệu hỗ trợ việc tạo câu hỏi (QG) trong lĩnh vực giáo dục. Với các mẫu QG, chúng tôi cho thấy mô hình QG được đào tạo trên Fairmarket có khả năng đặt câu hỏi chất lượng cao và đa dạng hơn.', 'nl': 'Vragen beantwoorden (QA) is een fundamenteel middel om het beoordelen en trainen van verhalende begripsvaardigheden voor zowel machines als jonge kinderen te vergemakkelijken, maar er is schaarste aan hoogwaardige QA-datasets die zorgvuldig zijn ontworpen om dit doel te dienen. Met name bestaande datasets onderscheiden zelden fijnkorrelige leesvaardigheden, zoals het begrijpen van verschillende narratieve elementen. Op basis van het onderzoek naar leeseducatie introduceren we FairytaleQA, een dataset gericht op narratief begrip van kleuterschool aan achtste klas studenten. FairytaleQA, gegenereerd door educatieve experts op basis van een evidence-based theoretisch kader, bestaat uit 10.580 expliciete en impliciete vragen afgeleid van 278 kindvriendelijke verhalen, die zeven soorten narratieve elementen of relaties bestrijken. Onze dataset is waardevol in twee opzichten: Ten eerste hebben we bestaande QA-modellen op onze dataset uitgevoerd en bevestigd dat deze annotatie helpt bij het beoordelen van de fijngranige leervaardigheden van modellen. Ten tweede ondersteunt de dataset vragengeneratie (QG) taak in het onderwijsdomein. Door benchmarking met QG modellen laten we zien dat het QG model getraind op FairytaleQA in staat is om kwalitatief hoogwaardige en diversere vragen te stellen.', 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси е основно средство за улесняване на оценката и обучението на уменията за разбиране на разказа както за машините, така и за малките деца, но все пак липсват висококачествени набори от данни за оценка на качеството, внимателно проектирани да обслужват тази цел. По-специално съществуващите набори от данни рядко разграничават фините умения за четене, като например разбирането на различни разказващи елементи. Въз основа на изследването на образованието за четене представяме набор от данни, фокусиран върху поверителното разбиране на детската градина за ученици от осми клас. Създаден от образователни експерти въз основа на теоретична рамка, базирана на доказателства, се състои от 10 580 изрични и имплицитни въпроса, произтичащи от 278 детски истории, обхващащи седем вида разказни елементи или взаимоотношения. Нашият набор от данни е ценен в две последователности: Първо, стартирахме съществуващи модели за оценка на качеството на нашия набор от данни и потвърдихме, че тази анотация помага да се оценят фините умения за учене на моделите. Второ, наборът от данни поддържа задача за генериране на въпроси (QG) в областта на образованието. Чрез сравнителен анализ с модели показваме, че моделът обучен по Приказка е способен да задава висококачествени и по-разнообразни въпроси.', 'da': 'Spørgsmålsbesvarelse (QA) er et grundlæggende middel til at lette vurdering og træning af fortællingsforfattelsesfærdigheder for både maskiner og små børn, men der er knaphed på kvalitetsdatasæt, der er omhyggeligt designet til at tjene dette formål. Især eksisterende datasæt skelner sjældent mellem finkornede læsefærdigheder, såsom forståelsen af forskellige fortællingselementer. Med udgangspunkt i læseuddannelsesforskningen introducerer vi FairytaleQA, et datasæt med fokus på narrativ forståelse af børnehaver til elever i ottende klasse. Genereret af pædagogiske eksperter baseret på en evidensbaseret teoretisk ramme, FairytaleQA består af 10.580 eksplicitte og implicitte spørgsmål afledt af 278 børnevenlige historier, der dækker syv typer fortællingselementer eller relationer. Vores datasæt er værdifuldt i to folder: For det første kørte vi eksisterende QA-modeller på vores datasæt og bekræftede, at denne annotation hjælper med at vurdere modellernes finkornede læringsevner. For det andet understøtter datasættet spørgsmålstegnelse (QG) opgaver på uddannelsesområdet. Gennem benchmarking med QG modeller viser vi, at QG modellen trænet på FairytaleQA er i stand til at stille spørgsmål af høj kvalitet og mere forskelligartede.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na pitanje (QA) je temeljni način za olakšanje procjene i obuke vještina razumijevanja priče za strojeve i mlade djece, a ipak nema nedostatka visokokvalitetnih podataka QA-a koji su pažljivo dizajnirani kako bi služili ovu svrhu. Posebno postojeće podaci rijetko razlikuju vještine pročitanja zgodnog zrnca, poput razumijevanja različitih priče. Prema istraživanju obrazovanja čitanja, predstavljamo FairytaleQA, set podataka koji se fokusira na priču o razumijevanju djetinjskog artena do studenata osmog razreda. Generirali su obrazovni stručnjaci na temelju teorijskog okvira na temelju dokaza, FairytaleQA sastoji od 10 580 jasnih i implicitnih pitanja iz 278 priče o djeci, koje pokrivaju sedam vrsta priče ili odnosa. Naša kompleta podataka je vrijedna u dva puta: Prvo, pokrenuli smo postojeće QA modele na našoj kompletu podataka i potvrdili da ova annotacija pomaže procijeniti dobre vještine učenja modela. Drugo, kompleta podataka podržava zadatak generacije pitanja (QG) u oblasti obrazovanja. Kroz kriteriju s QG modelima pokazujemo da je QG model obučen na FairytaleQA sposoban postavljati visoke kvalitete i različite pitanja.', 'de': 'Die Beantwortung von Fragen (QA) ist ein grundlegendes Mittel, um sowohl Maschinen als auch Kleinkindern die Beurteilung und das Training von narrativen Fähigkeiten zu erleichtern. Dennoch gibt es nur wenige qualitativ hochwertige QA-Datensätze, die sorgfältig für diesen Zweck entwickelt wurden. Insbesondere bestehende Datensätze unterscheiden selten feinkörnige Lesefähigkeiten, wie das Verständnis unterschiedlicher narrativer Elemente. Basierend auf der Lesepädagogik-Forschung stellen wir FairytaleQA vor, einen Datensatz zum narrativen Verständnis von Kindergärten für Schüler der achten Klasse. FairytaleQA wurde von Bildungsexperten auf der Grundlage eines evidenzbasierten theoretischen Rahmens generiert und besteht aus 10.580 expliziten und impliziten Fragen, die aus 278 kinderfreundlichen Geschichten abgeleitet werden und sieben Arten von narrativen Elementen oder Beziehungen abdecken. Unser Datensatz ist in zweierlei Hinsicht wertvoll: Erstens haben wir bestehende QA-Modelle auf unserem Datensatz getestet und bestätigt, dass diese Annotation hilft, die feinen Lernfähigkeiten von Modellen zu bewerten. Zweitens unterstützt der Datensatz Fragegenerierungsaufgaben (QG) im Bildungsbereich. Durch Benchmarking mit QG-Modellen zeigen wir, dass das auf FairytaleQA trainierte QG-Modell in der Lage ist, qualitativ hochwertige und vielfältigere Fragen zu stellen.', 'id': 'Jawaban pertanyaan (QA) adalah cara fundamental untuk memudahkan penilaian dan pelatihan keterampilan pemahaman narratif untuk mesin dan anak-anak muda, namun ada kekurangan dataset QA kualitas tinggi yang direncanakan dengan hati-hati untuk melayani tujuan ini. Terutama, dataset yang ada jarang membedakan keterampilan pembacaan fine grained, seperti pemahaman dari berbagai elemen cerita. Melukis penelitian pendidikan pembacaan, kami memperkenalkan FairytaleQA, sebuah set data yang fokus pada pemahaman narratif dari taman anak ke siswa kelas delapan. Dihasilkan oleh ahli pendidikan berdasarkan cadangan teori berdasarkan bukti, FairytaleQA terdiri dari 10.580 pertanyaan eksplicit dan implicit yang berasal dari 278 cerita ramah anak-anak, meliputi tujuh jenis elemen narratif atau hubungan. Set data kita berharga dalam dua kali: Pertama, kami menjalankan model QA yang ada di dataset kami dan mengkonfirmasi bahwa anotasi ini membantu menilai kemampuan belajar model yang baik. Kedua, dataset mendukung tugas generasi pertanyaan (QG) dalam bidang pendidikan. Through benchmarking with QG models, we show that the QG model trained on FairytaleQA is capable of asking high-quality and more diverse questions.', 'sw': 'Swali la kujibu (QA) ni njia ya msingi ya kusaidia kutathmini na mafunzo ya ujuzi wa kuelimisha simulizi kwa mashine na watoto, lakini bado kuna uhaba wa seti za takwimu za juu za QA zilizolengwa kwa makini kutumika kwa lengo hili. hasa, taarifa zinazopo zinatofautiana nadra sana kwa ujuzi wa kusoma vizuri, kama vile uelewa wa vipengele vinavyotofauti na simulizi. Kutokana na tafiti ya elimu ya kusoma, tunaonyesha FairytaleQA, seti ya taarifa inayolenga kuelezea maelezo ya watoto hadi wanafunzi wa darasa la nane. Utengenezwa na wataalam wa elimu kwa kutumia miundombinu ya msingi inayothibitisha, FairytaleQA ina maswali ya wazi 10,580 na yenye maana yanayotokana na hadithi za watoto 278, zinazohusu aina saba ya vipengele vya habari au mahusiano. Mpango wetu wa taarifa ni wa thamani katika viungo viwili: Kwanza, tuliendesha mifano ya QA iliyopo kwenye seti yetu ya data na tukathibitisha kuwa taarifa hii inasaidia kuchunguza ujuzi wa mafunzo mazuri. Pili, seti ya data inaunga mkono vizazi vya maswali (QG) katika maeneo ya elimu. Kupitia kutumia bendera na mifano ya QG, tunaonyesha kuwa mtindo wa QG ulioelekezwa kwenye FairytaleQA unaweza kuuliza maswali yenye ubora na tofauti zaidi.', 'ko': '질의응답(QA)은 기계와 유아의 서사적 이해 기능 평가와 교육을 촉진하는 기본 수단이지만, 이를 달성하기 위해 고품질의 질의응답 데이터집은 드물다.특히 기존의 데이터 집합은 세립도를 구분하는 읽기 기능, 예를 들어 서로 다른 서사 요소에 대한 이해가 매우 적다.읽기 교육 연구를 토대로 우리는 FairytaleQA, 유치원에서 8학년까지의 학생들의 서사 이해를 주목하는 데이터 집합을 소개했다.동화 문답은 교육 전문가들이 근거 있는 이론 구조를 바탕으로 작성한 것으로 10580개의 현성과 숨은 문제로 구성되고 278개의 어린이 우호 이야기에서 왔으며 7가지 서사 요소나 관계를 포함한다.우리의 데이터 집합은 두 가지 가치가 있다. 첫째, 우리는 데이터 집합에서 기존의QA모델을 운행했고 이 주석이 모델의 세립도 학습 기능을 평가하는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 확인했다.그 다음으로 이 데이터 세트는 교육 분야의 문제 생성(QG) 임무를 지원한다.QG모델을 이용한 기준 테스트를 통해 FairytaleQA에서 교육된 QG모델이 높은 품질과 다양한 문제를 제기할 수 있음을 증명하였다.', 'tr': "Sugabat jogabaty (QA) esasy taýýarlamak hem maşynlar hem ýa ş çagalar üçin ýokary kaliteli QA veri setirleriniň azalygyna seretmek üçin düzümlenmegi we paýdalanmegi aňsat etmek üçin esasy bir mätçidir. Aýratyn bolsa, bar maglumat düzümleri gadyry okamak ukyplaryny, dürli hekaýat elementlerini düşünmek ýaly tapawutlar. Okuw araştyrmasynda FairytaleQA'y görkezip, sagat bagynyň 8-nji synpdaky okuwçylara üns berýäris. Okuwçy ekspertliler tarapyndan döredilen kanunlar teoriýaly framda daýan ýan, FairytaleQA 10,580 sany ajaýyp we möhüm soraglarynyň 278 çaga dost hekaýalardan döredilen, 7 tür hekaýat elementleriň we baglaýyşlaryň üstünde degişli. Berüvlerimiz iki katda deň. Birinji, biz bar bar QA modellerimizi berüvlendirdik we bu duýdurma modelleriniň iň az öwrenme ukyplaryny barlamaga kömek edip otyrdyk. Ikinjisi, sanat setiriniň bilim domaýynda soraglaryň (QG) täbligini destekleýär. QG modelleri bilen benchmarklaşdyryp, FairytaleQA'da bilinmeli QG modeliniň üst-kalitede we daşyp dürli soraglary soramagy başarar.", 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال (QA) یک وسیله بنیادی برای آسانی ارزیابی و آموزش مهارت درک داستان برای ماشین\u200cها و کودکان جوان است، ولی کمی از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای QA با دقت طراحی شده برای خدمت این هدف وجود ندارد. مخصوصا، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای موجود کمی مهارت خواندن نیکو را تفاوت می\u200cدهند، مانند درک عناصر مختلف داستان\u200cها. با توجه به تحقیقات آموزشی خواندن، ما FairytaleQA را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک مجموعه داده\u200cای که روی فهمیدن داستان\u200cهای کودکان به دانشجویان هشتم کلاس تمرکز می\u200cکند. توسط متخصص آموزشی که بر اساس یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما در دو مرتبه ارزشمند است: اول، ما مدل QA موجود در مجموعه داده\u200cهایمان را اجرا کردیم و تایید کردیم که این یادآوری به ارزش مهارت یادآوری خوب مدل کمک می\u200cکند. دوم، مجموعه داده\u200cها کار نسل سوال (QG) را در حوزه آموزش پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. از طریق برچسب کردن با مدل QG نشان می دهیم که مدل QG آموزش یافته در FairytaleQA قادر است از سؤال های کیفیت بالا و مختلف تر بپرسد.', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve (QA) është një mjet thelbësor për të lehtësuar vlerësimin dhe trainimin e aftësive të kuptimit tregues si për makinat ashtu edhe për fëmijët e vegjël, megjithatë ka mungesë të datasets QA të cilësisë së lartë të dizajnuar me kujdes për të shërbyer këtë qëllim. In particular, existing datasets rarely distinguish fine-grained reading skills, such as the understanding of varying narrative elements.  Duke u mbështetur në kërkimin e arsimit të leximit, ne prezantojmë FairytaleQA, një set të dhënash që përqëndrohet në kuptimin tregues të kopshtit të fëmijëve për studentët e klasës së tetë. Gjeneruar nga ekspertët arsimorë bazuar në një kuadër teorik bazuar në prova, FairytaleQA përbëhet nga 10,580 pyetje të shprehura dhe implicite të nxjerra nga 278 histori miqësore me fëmijë, duke mbuluar shtatë lloje elementesh treguese apo marrëdhënieve. Të dhënat tona janë të vlefshme në dy pika: Së pari, kemi punuar modele QA ekzistuese në grupin tonë të dhënash dhe kemi konfirmuar se kjo anotacion ndihmon të vlerësojmë aftësitë e mësimit të bukura të modeleve. Së dyti, grupi i të dhënave mbështet detyrën e gjenerimit të pyetjeve (QG) në fushën e arsimit. Through benchmarking with QG models, we show that the QG model trained on FairytaleQA is capable of asking high-quality and more diverse questions.', 'af': "Vraog antwoord (QA) is 'n fundamentele betekening om die evaluering en onderwerking van verklare verstandighede vir beide masjiene en jong kinders te eenvoudig, maar daar is skaars van hoë-kwaliteit QA datastelle versigtig ontwerp om hierdie doel te dien. In besonderhede, bestaande datastelle het selfs gevaardig fyn-koring leesbaarde, soos die verstanding van verskillende narratiewe elemente. As ons op die lees-onderwerp onderwerp, introduseer ons FairytaleQA, 'n datastel wat fokus op die verklaring van kindergarte tot agtste grade studente. Gegenereer deur opvoedkundige eksperte gebaseer op 'n bevestige teorieese raamwerk, FairytaleQA bestaan van 10,580 eksplisiese en inplisite vrae wat van 278 kinders-vriendelike stories afgelei het, met die oordeel van sewe tipes narratiewe elemente of relasies. Ons datastel is waardelik in twee voue: Eerste, ons hardloop bestaande QA-modele op ons datastel en bevestig dat hierdie annotasie hulp aan die assensie van modele se fin-kornerede leerstaalde. Tweede, die datastel ondersteun vraag generasie (QG) taak in die onderwys domein. Deur benchmarking met QG-modelles, wys ons dat die QG-model wat op FairytaleQA onderrig is, is in staat om hoë-kwaliteit en meer verskillende vrae te vra.", 'hy': 'Հարցերի պատասխանը հիմնարար միջոց է մեքենաների և փոքր երեխաների համար պատմության ընկալության հմտությունների գնահատման և ուսումնասիրության հեշտացման համար, սակայն չկա բարձր որակի QA տվյալների համակարգերի, որոնք ուշադիր նախագծված են այս նպատակին ծառայելու համար: Հատկապես, գոյություն ունեցող տվյալների համակարգերը հազվադեպ են տարբերում գեղեցիկ կարդալու հմտությունները, ինչպիսիք են տարբեր պատմության տարրերի հասկացությունը: Հիմնվելով կրթության ընթերցման ուսումնասիրության վրա, մենք ներկայացնում ենք Ֆեյրիտալե QA-ը, տվյալների համակարգը, որը կենտրոնանում է մանկապարտեզի պատմության ընկալության վրա 8-րդ դասարանի աշակերտներին: Պատրաստված կրթական մասնագետների կողմից, որը հիմնված է ապացույցների վրա հիմնված տեսական շրջանակի վրա, Ֆերատալեքսը կազմում է 10,580 բացատրական և անտեղի հարցեր, որոնք առաջացել են 278 երեխաներին ընդունակ պատմություններից, որոնք ներառում են 7 տեսակի պատմություն Մեր տվյալների համակարգը արժեքավոր է երկու անգամ: Առաջինը, մենք կատարեցինք մեր տվյալների համակարգում գոյություն ունեցող QA մոդելներ և հաստատեցինք, որ այս նոտացիան օգնում է գնահատել մոդելների լավ սովորելու հմտությունները: Երկրորդ, տվյալների համակարգը աջակցում է կրթության ոլորտում հարցերի ստեղծման (QG) խնդիրը: QG մոդելների հետ կապված համեմատական համեմատության միջոցով մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ՖերատալեՔԱ-ում վարժեցված QG մոդելը կարող է բարձր որակի և ավելի բազմազան հարցեր տալ:', 'am': 'ጥያቄ መልስ (QA) ለኮምፒዩተር እና ለሕፃናቶች እና ዋነቶችን ማስተካከል እና ማስተካከል የሚያስፈልገው የዋና ማህበረሰብ ነው፤ ነገር ግን ለዚህ ምክንያት ለማገልገል የደረጃ የQA ዳታ ማህበረሰብ ግንኙነት አለበት፡፡ በተለይም፣ የአሁኑን ዳታተርቶች በተለያዩ ታሪክ አካላትን ለማስተዋል በሚያሳየው ጥሩ እውቀትን እንደሚለየቁ ጥቂት ነው፡፡ የትምህርት ትምህርት ትምህርት ትምህርት ላይ በመቀበል፣ ፍሪታቴክQA፣ የዝናርጋንት ወደ ስምንት ተማሪዎች ተማሪዎች ማሳየትን የሚያስታወቅ የዳታ ደረጃዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Generated by educational experts based on an evidence-based theoretical framework, FairytaleQA consists of 10,580 explicit and implicit questions derived from 278 children-friendly stories, covering seven types of narrative elements or relations.  የዳታ ሳጥን በሁለት ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ ዋጋ ነው፤ በመጀመሪያው የQA ሞዴላዎችን በዳታ ሳንሰርነው እና ይህ አካባቢ የሞላዎችን ጥያቄ እውቀት እንዲያስረዳ አረጋገጥን፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ የዳታ ሳጥን የጥያቄን ትውልድ (QG) ስራ ትምህርት ድህረት ይጨምርበታል፡፡ በQA ላይ የተማረከውን የQG ሞዴላዎችን በመጫወት እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'az': "Soru cavab vermək (QA) maşınlar və genç uşaqlar üçün hekayət anlama yetkinliklərinin vuruşmasını və təhsil etməsini asanlaşdırmaq üçün əsl bir vasitədir, amma bu məqsəd istifadə etmək üçün yüksək kaliteli QA veri setlərinin zəifliyi yoxdur. Özellikle, mevcut verilən qurğular müxtəlif hekayət elementlərinin anlaması kimi gözəl dənəli oxumaq yetkinliklərini seçirlər. Okuma təhsil araştırmasına görə FairytaleQA, 8-ci sınıf öğrencilərə məlumat qurmağı ilə danışan bir veri qurmağı tanıyırıq. FairytaleQA, təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil təhsil edilmişdir. FairytaleQA, 278 çocuk dostu hekayələrindən təhsil edilmiş, yeddi tür hekayət elementlərini və ilişkilərini örtür. Bizim verilənlərimiz iki dəfə değerlidir: ilk dəfə, biz verilənlərimizin QA modellərini təsdiqlədik və bu məlumatın modellərin yaxşı dənli öyrənmə yetkinliklərini təsdiqlədik. İkincisi, verilən qurğu sual nəsili (QG) işlərini təhsil domeində dəstəkləyir. QG modellərlə benchmarking olaraq FairytaleQA'da təhsil edilmiş QG modeli yüksək kaliteli və daha müxtəlif suallar soruşmağa qadir olduğunu göstəririk.", 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes (QA) és un mitjà fonamental per facilitar la valoració i formació de habilitats de comprensió narrativa tant per màquines com per nens petits, però hi ha escassetat de conjunts de dades d'QA d'alta qualitat dissenyats atentament per servir aquest objectiu. En particular, els conjunts de dades existents rarament distingeixen habilitats de lectura fina, com la comprensió de diversos elements narrativs. basant-nos en la recerca d'educació en lectura, introduïm FairytaleQA, un conjunt de dades centrat en la comprensió narrativa del jardí infantil a estudiants de vuit grau. Generat per experts educatius basats en un marc teòric basat en evidències, FairytaleQA consisteix en 10.580 preguntes explícites i implícites derivades de 278 històries amigables dels nens, que cobreixen set tipus d'elements narrativs o relacions. El nostre conjunt de dades és valiós en dos casos: primer, vam fer servir models QA existents en el nostre conjunt de dades i vam confirmar que aquesta anotació ajuda a evaluar les habilitats d'aprenentatge fins dels models. Segon, el conjunt de dades suporta la tasca de generació de preguntes (QG) en el domini educatiu. A través de comparacions amb models QG, demostram que el model QG entrenat en FairytaleQA és capaç de fer preguntes d'alta qualitat i més diverses.", 'bs': 'Odgovor na pitanja (QA) je osnovna sredstva za olakšanje procjene i obuke vještina priče o razumijevanju za mašine i mlade djece, a ipak nema nedostatka visokokvalitetnih podataka QA-a koji su pažljivo dizajnirani da služe ovu svrhu. Posebno, postojeće podaci rijetko razlikuju vještine pročitanja zgodnog zrnca, poput razumijevanja različitih priče. Prema istraživanju obrazovanja čitanja, predstavljamo FairytaleQA, set podataka koji se fokusira na priču o razumijevanju djetinjske arterije do studenata osmog razreda. Generirali su obrazovni stručnjaci na temelju teoretičkog okvira na temelju dokaza, FairytaleQA sastoji od 10.580 ekskluzivnih i implicitnih pitanja iz 278 priče o djeci, koje pokrivaju sedam vrsta priče ili odnosa. Naša kompleta podataka je vrijedna u dva puta: prvo, pokrenuli smo postojeće QA modele na našoj kompletu podataka i potvrdili da ova annotacija pomaže procjeniti dobre vještine učenja modela. Drugo, komplet podržava zadatak generacije pitanja (QG) u obrazovanju. Kroz benchmarking sa QG modelima, pokazujemo da je QG model obučen na FairytaleQA sposoban da postavlja visoke kvalitete i raznolike pitanja.', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউএ) হচ্ছে একটি মৌলিক মানুষ যা মেশিন এবং শিশুদের জন্য বিস্তারিত তথ্য মূল্যবোধের দক্ষতা মূল্য এবং প্রশিক্ষণের সুবিধা প্রদান করতে পারে, কিন বিশেষ করে, বিদ্যমান ডাটাসেট বিভিন্ন বর্ণনার উপাদানের বুঝতে খুব কমই বিচ্ছিন্ন করে। শিক্ষা গবেষণা নিয়ে আমরা ফায়রিতেলিকিয়াকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, একটি ডাটাসেট, যা কিন্তু কিন্তু শিক্ষার্থীদের কাছে আট গ্রেড ছাত প্রমাণ ভিত্তিক ততিত্তিক কাঠামোর উপর ভিত্তিক শিক্ষা বিশেষজ্ঞ তৈরি করেছেন, ফেয়ারিতেলিকিউএ এর মধ্যে ১০,৫৮০ ব্যক্তিগত এবং ২৭৮ শিশুদের বন্ধুত্বের গল্প থেকে প আমাদের ডাটাসেট দুই ফোল্ডারে মূল্যবান: প্রথমে, আমরা আমাদের ডাটাসেটে বিদ্যমান কিউ এ মডেল চালিয়েছি এবং নিশ্চিত করেছি যে এই বিষয়টি মডেল দ্বিতীয়, ডাটাসেট শিক্ষা ডোমেইনে প্রশ্নের প্রজন্ম (কিউজি) কাজ সমর্থন করে। কিউজি মডেলের মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ফেয়ারিতালিকায় কিউএ প্রশিক্ষিত কিউজি মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করতে সক্ষম।', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine on oluline vahend narratiivse mõistmise oskuste hindamise ja koolitamise hõlbustamiseks nii masinate kui ka väikelaste jaoks, kuid kvaliteetseid kvaliteedi tagamise andmekogumeid on vähe, mis on hoolikalt kavandatud selleks eesmärgiks. Eelkõige eristavad olemasolevad andmekogumid harva põhjalikke lugemisoskusi, näiteks erinevate narratiivsete elementide mõistmist. Lugemishariduse uuringutele tuginedes tutvustame FairytaleQA-d, andmekogumit, mis keskendub lasteaia narratiivsele arusaamisele kaheksanda klassi õpilastele. Tõenduspõhisel teoreetilisel raamistikul põhineva hariduseksperdi loodud FairytaleQA koosneb 10 580 selgesõnalisest ja kaudsest küsimusest, mis on pärit 278 lastesõbralikust loost, mis hõlmavad seitset tüüpi narratiivseid elemente või suhteid. Meie andmekogum on väärtuslik kahes korras: esiteks kasutasime oma andmekogumil olemasolevaid kvaliteedi tagamise mudeleid ja kinnitasime, et see märkus aitab hinnata mudelite põhjalikke õppimisoskusi. Teiseks toetab andmekogum küsimuste genereerimise ülesannet hariduse valdkonnas. QG mudelitega võrdlemise kaudu näitame, et FairytaleQA-le koolitatud QG mudel suudab esitada kvaliteetseid ja mitmekesisemaid küsimusi.', 'cs': 'Odpověď na otázky (QA) je základním prostředkem pro usnadnění hodnocení a školení dovedností porozumění narativním strojům i malým dětem, přesto existuje nedostatek kvalitních datových sad QA pečlivě navržených k tomuto účelu. Zejména existující datové soubory zřídka rozlišují jemné čtenářské dovednosti, jako je porozumění různým narativním prvkům. Na základě výzkumu čtenářské výchovy představujeme FairytaleQA, datový soubor zaměřený na narativní porozumění mateřské školy studentům osmé třídy. FairytaleQA je generována pedagogickými odborníky založenými na teoretickém rámci založeném na důkazech a sestává z 10,580 explicitních a implicitních otázek odvozených z 278 příběhů přátelských pro děti, které pokrývají sedm typů narativních prvků nebo vztahů. Náš datový soubor je cenný ve dvou složkách: Zaprvé jsme provedli existující modely QA na našem datovém souboru a potvrdili, že tato anotace pomáhá hodnotit jemné učební dovednosti modelů. Za druhé datová sada podporuje úlohu generování otázek (QG) ve vzdělávací doméně. Prostřednictvím srovnání s QG modely ukazujeme, že QG model trénovaný na FairytaleQA je schopen klást vysoce kvalitní a rozmanitější otázky.', 'fi': 'Kysymyksiin vastaaminen (QA) on keskeinen keino helpottaa kertomusten ymmärtämisen taitojen arviointia ja koulutusta sekä koneille että pienille lapsille, mutta tätä tarkoitusta varten huolellisesti suunniteltuja korkealaatuisia laadunvarmistustietoja on niukasti. Varsinkin olemassa olevissa aineistoissa harvoin erotetaan toisistaan hienojakoisia lukutaitoja, kuten erilaisten kerronnallisten elementtien ymmärtämistä. Lukukasvatustutkimuksen pohjalta esittelemme FairytaleQA-aineiston, joka keskittyy päiväkodin kerronnalliseen ymmärtämiseen kahdeksannen luokan oppilaille. FairytaleQA koostuu 10 580 eksplisiittisestä ja implisiittisestä kysymyksestä, jotka on johdettu 278 lapsiystävällisestä tarinasta ja jotka kattavat seitsemän erilaista kerronnallista elementtiä tai suhdetta. Aineistomme on arvokasta kahdessa osassa: ensin suoritimme olemassa olevia laadunvarmistusmalleja aineistossamme ja vahvistimme, että tämä merkintä auttaa arvioimaan mallien hienojakoisia oppimistaitoja. Toiseksi aineisto tukee kysymyksen tuottamista koulutusalalla. QG-mallien esikuva-analyysin avulla osoitamme, että FairytaleQA-ohjelmaan koulutettu QG-malli pystyy esittämään laadukkaita ja monipuolisempia kysymyksiä.', 'he': 'עניין לשאלות (QA) הוא אמצע יסודי כדי להקל את הערכה והאימון של כישורי הבנה הסיפורית למכונות וגם לילדים צעירים, אך יש חסר קבוצות מידע QA איכות גבוהה שנועדו בזהירות כדי לשרת את המטרה הזאת. במיוחד, קבוצות נתונים קיימות לעיתים נדירות מבחינים כישורי קריאה מעולה, כמו הבנה של אלמנטים סיפורים שונים. בהתבסס על מחקר החינוך בקריאה, אנחנו מציגים FairytaleQA, קבוצת נתונים שמוקדת על הבנה סיפורית של גן ילדים לסטודנטים בכיתה שמונה. מיוצרים על ידי מומחים חינוכיים מבוססים על סגרת תיאורטית מבוססת ראיות, FairytaleQA מורכבת מ-10,580 שאלות ברורות ופשוטות שנוצרו מ-278 סיפורים ידידותיים לילדים, מכילים שבעה סוגים של אלמנטים סיפורים או יחסים. קודם כל, ניהלנו דוגמנים QA קיימים על קבוצת הנתונים שלנו ואשר שהציונים האלה עוזרים להעריך כישורי הלימודים של דוגמנים. Second, the dataset supports question generation (QG) task in the education domain.  באמצעות בדיקת השוואה עם דוגמנים QG, אנחנו מראים שהדוגמנית QG מאומנת על FairytaleQA מסוגלת לשאול שאלות איכות גבוהה ומגווונות יותר.', 'ha': 'QA ya zama na amfani da tunkuɗe wa masu fassarawa na fassarar kunnufi ga mashinaki da yãro, kuma amma, there yana da hasara na danganta masu nauyi na QA da wajen aikin ka yi amfani da wannan aiki. Kuma da ƙayyade, tsarin dane da ke gaba, haƙin yana rarrabe abincin da aka naɗa mai kyau, kamar fahimci na ƙanshi na daban-daban. QA, ana sami karatun karatun karatun karatun na FeryHistorQA, ana fassarar da fassarar lãbãrin zuwa karatun takwas. Generated by educational experts based on an evidence-based theoretical framework, FairytaleQA consists of 10,580 explicit and implicit questions derived from 278 children-friendly stories, covering seven types of narrative elements or relations.  Kima tsarin danganmu na cikin ƙungiyoyi biyu: Kayyan, mun tafiyar da masallatan QA masu gaba a kan tsarin danganmu, kuma mun gaskata cewa wannan zartarwa yana taimako da haƙin tsarin misãlai masu tsari mai kyau. Kijan, shirin dataset yana ƙarfafa wa halin QG a cikin komai. QA yana iya iya tambaya masu tsari da misalin QG.', 'jv': 'Ing ujong-ujong sing berusahaan (qA) iki sak mungkar perusahaan penting nggunakake karo halekan karo perusahaan nyong awak dhéwé kuwi mau, ngangge iso kaya perusahaan karo pak sampeyan lan cilik, iso nguasai perusahaan seneng dataset sing dipunangé awak dhéwé, akeh iso dianggap akeh per Genjer-genjer Ngawe ngulinggo perusahaan edukasi nggawe, awak dhéwé ngerasakno "Failed yTalk Genjer-genjer pergambar punika ingkang dipuwisan ning basa kegambar theoretik, FeytalqA karo 10 Awak dhéwé dataset iki luwih barang sampeyan gak dhéwé: First, we ran model sing dadi nggawe dataset iki ngono ngêpakan ngerti, populasyon iki dadi bener dhéwé nggawe sistem sing bisa diangkamus model sing apik dhéwé. Second, the dataset supported question Generation (qG) task in the acamera domain. Ato bendhurahan kanggo model GG, kita ngomong nik model GG sing ditambah luwih-luwih hayo sing gawe nguasai kealitaan lan akeh seneng pisan seneng pisan.', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja je temeljno sredstvo za lažje ocenjevanje in usposabljanje pripovednih sposobnosti razumevanja tako strojev kot majhnih otrok, vendar pa je pomanjkljivo visokokakovostnih naborov podatkov o kakovosti, ki so skrbno oblikovani za ta namen. Zlasti obstoječi nabori podatkov redko razlikujejo drobnozrnate bralne sposobnosti, kot je razumevanje različnih pripovednih elementov. Na podlagi raziskav branja predstavljamo FairytaleQA, nabor podatkov, ki se osredotoča na pripovedno razumevanje vrtca za učence osmega razreda. Pravljica QA, ki jo ustvarijo izobraževalni strokovnjaki na podlagi teoretičnega okvira, temelji na dokazih, sestavlja 10.580 eksplicitnih in implicitnih vprašanj iz 278 otrokom prijaznih zgodb, ki zajemajo sedem vrst pripovednih elementov ali odnosov. Naš nabor podatkov je dragocen v dveh vrstah: Prvič, na našem naboru podatkov smo zagnali obstoječe modele kakovosti in potrdili, da ta opomba pomaga oceniti natančne učne spretnosti modelov. Drugič, nabor podatkov podpira nalogo ustvarjanja vprašanj (QG) na področju izobraževanja. S primerjalno analizo z modeli QG dokazujemo, da je model QG, usposobljen za FairytaleQA, sposoben postavljati kakovostna in bolj raznolika vprašanja.', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་གིས་ལན་གསལ་བ(QA)ནི་རྨན་གཞི་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དེ་འདིས་ལག་འཁྱེར་དང་བུ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཡོད་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གཙོ་རིམ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན། དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པར། གནས་ཡུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནུས་པ་སྟབས་ཀྱིས་ཕལ་ཆེན་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ལ། ལྟ་བུ་ཤེས་ཡོན་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་བྲིས་པ་ལྟ་བུ་འཇུག་སྟེ། ང་ཚོས་FairytaleQA ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་ཡིག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཚོགས ངལ་རྩིས་ཅན་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཕྱོགས་གཙོ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་དཔེ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་(FairytaleQA)ཡིས་10,580 ཁྱད་འཕགས་དང་ཁྱད་འཕགས་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག་ཞིབ་འབྱུ ང་ཚོའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་ཡིག་སྣོད་གཉིས་ནང་གི་རིན་ཐང་ཡོད། གཉིས་པ། གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚབ་གྱིས་ཤེས་ཡོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། QG མ་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐབས་ལམ་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་FairytaleQA པར་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་QG རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོ་ཚད་དང་མི་འདྲི་བ་སྣེ་མང་ཙམ'}
{'en': 'Alignment-Augmented Consistent Translation for Multilingual Open Information Extraction', 'ar': 'KaFSP: التحليل الدلالي الضبابي المدرك للمعرفة للإجابة على أسئلة المحادثة عبر قاعدة معرفية واسعة النطاق', 'fr': 'KafSP\xa0: analyse sémantique floue consciente des connaissances pour répondre à des questions conversationnelles sur une base de connaissances à grande échelle', 'es': 'KafSP: Análisis semántico difuso consciente del conocimiento para responder a preguntas conversacionales en una base de conocimientos a gran escala', 'pt': 'KaFSP: Análise semântica difusa com reconhecimento de conhecimento para resposta a perguntas de conversação em uma base de conhecimento de grande escala', 'ja': 'KaFSP ：大規模な知識ベース上で会話的質問に答えるための知識意識ファジーなセマンティック構文解析', 'zh': 'KaFSP曰:知识模糊语义解析,以大知识库对', 'hi': 'KaFSP: ज्ञान-जागरूक फजी सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग संवादात्मक प्रश्न के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर ज्ञान आधार पर उत्तर देना', 'ru': 'KaFSP: Нечеткий семантический анализ знаний для ответа на разговорный вопрос в крупномасштабной базе знаний', 'ga': 'KaFSP: Parsáil Shéimeantach Doiléir atá Feasach ar an Eolas le haghaidh Ceist Chomhrá a Fhreagrú thar Bhunáit Eolais ar Mhórscála', 'ka': 'KaFSP: მეცნიერება-ცოცხოვრებული სემანტიკური პარამენტიკური პარამენტიკური პარამენტი პარამენტიკური კითხვებისთვის, რომელიც უფრო დიდი სკვილის მეცნიერება', 'hu': 'KaFSP: Tudás-tudatos, zavaros szemantikus értelmezés a beszélgetési kérdések nagyméretű tudásbázison keresztül történő megválaszolásához', 'el': 'Η γνώση-συνειδητή θολή σημασιολογική ανάλυση για την απάντηση σε συνομιλιακές ερωτήσεις μέσω μιας μεγάλης κλίμακας Γνωσιακής βάσης', 'it': 'KaFSP: Analisi semantica confusa consapevole della conoscenza per rispondere alle domande di conversazione su una base di conoscenze su larga scala', 'mk': 'KaFSP: Лажно семантично анализирање на знаење за одговор на конверзационални прашања преку база на големи знаења', 'lt': 'KaFSP: žinių sąmoningas neišsamus Semantinis analizavimas, skirtas atsakymui į konversacinius klausimus pagal didelės apimties žinių bazę', 'kk': 'KaFSP: Мәліметтер- білім білім негізінде жауап беру үлкен- масштабтағы білім негізінде жауап беру үлкен семантикалық талдау', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'KaFSP: Мэдлэг-мэдлэг мэдлэг-холбогдолтой холбогдолтой талаар ярилцлага асуултын хариулт том хэмжээний мэдлэг суурь дээр', 'mt': 'KaFSP: Analiżi Semantika Mhux Rikonoxxuta b’Għarfien għal Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet Konversazzjonali fuq Bażi ta’ Għarfien fuq Skala Kbar', 'ml': 'കാഎഫ്എസ്പി: അറിവുള്ള ഫ്യൂസി സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യം വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഉത്തരം നല്\u200d', 'ro': 'KaFSP: Analizare semantică fuzzy conștientă de cunoaștere pentru răspunsurile la întrebări conversaționale printr-o bază de cunoștințe la scară largă', 'pl': 'KaFSP: Świadome wiedzy rozmyte parowanie semantyczne dla odpowiedzi na pytania konwersacyjne za pośrednictwem wielkoskalowej bazy wiedzy', 'sr': 'KaFSP: Odgovor na razgovorno pitanje o velikoj bazi znanja', 'no': 'KaFSP: Knowledge-Aware Fuzzy Semantic Analysing for samtalespørsmål Svar over ein stor skal kjennende basen', 'so': 'KaFSP: Knowledge-Aware Fuzzy Semantic Parsing for Conversational Question Answering over a Large-Scale Knowledge Base', 'si': 'KaFSP: දැනගන්න-දන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් ලොකු ස්කේල් දැනගන්න අධාර්\u200dය', 'sv': 'KaFSP: Kunskapsmedveten Fuzzy Semantic Parsing för konversationsfrågesvar över en storskalig kunskapsbas', 'ta': 'கேஎஃப்எஸ்பி: பெரிய அளவு- அறிவு அடிப்படையின் மேல் தெரியும் அறிவு செமான்டிக் பாசம் செய்யும் பேச்சு கேள்விக்கு பதில்', 'ur': 'KaFSP: علم-Aware Fuzzy Semantic Parsing for Conversational Question Answering a Large-Scale Knowledge Base', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi tương đối trả lời dựa trên một nền hiểu biết diện rộng', 'bg': 'Мъгляво семантично анализиране за разговорни въпроси в широкомащабна база от знания', 'nl': 'KaFSP: Kennisbewuste Fuzzy Semantische Parsing voor het beantwoorden van conversatievragen via een grootschalige kennisbank', 'hr': 'KaFSP: Semantičko razmatranje znanja i znanja za razgovorno pitanje odgovor na veliku znanstvenu bazu', 'da': 'KaFSP: Videnbevidst fuzzy semantisk fortolkning til samtalespørgsmål besvarelse over en stor videnbase', 'de': 'KaFSP: Wissensbewusstes Fuzzy Semantic Parsing zur Beantwortung von Gesprächsfragen über eine große Wissensdatenbank', 'id': 'KaFSP: Penganalisan Semantik Berkabur Awas untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Berbicara melalui Pangkalan Pengetahuan Berskala Besar', 'ko': 'KaFSP: 대규모 지식 라이브러리에서 세션 문답의 지식 감지 모호한 의미 분석', 'fa': 'KaFSP: دانش-آگاهی درباره\u200cی پرسش\u200cهای مکالمه پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی یک پایگاه دانش\u200cهای بزرگ', 'tr': 'KaFSP', 'sw': 'paper size', 'sq': 'KaFSP: Analizë Semantike e Dëgjueshme për Përgjigjet e Pyetjeve Konversionale lidhur me një bazë të njohurive në shkallë të madhe', 'am': 'የውቀት አዋቂው የስማቴክ ምርጫዎች ለመንግግር ጥያቄ ላይ ትልቅ-Scale እውቀት መሠረት', 'af': "KaFSP: Knowledge-Aware Fuzzy Semantic Parsing vir Gespraakte Vrag Antwoord oor 'n Groot-Skaal kennis Basis", 'hy': 'ԿԱՖՍՊ. Գիտություն գիտելիս հիշողության հիմքում տեղեկատվության մեծ մասի', 'az': 'KaFSP: Büyük ölçü Bilim Üssünün üstündə cavab vermək üçün Bilim-Aware Sənli Semantik Taşıma', 'bn': 'কাএফএসপি: ব্যাপক পরিমাণ জ্ঞানের মাধ্যমে জ্ঞান-পরিচিত ফাজি সেম্যান্ডিক পার্সিং এর প্রতিক্রিয়া বিশাল পরিমাণ জ্ঞানের ভ', 'ca': 'KaFSP: Analització semitàtica falsa de coneixement per resposta a preguntes conversacionals sobre una base de coneixements a gran escala', 'cs': 'KaFSP: Znalostní rozmazané sémantické parsování pro konverzační otázky přes rozsáhlou znalostní bázi', 'bs': 'KaFSP: Semantičko razmatranje znanja i znanja za razgovorno pitanje odgovor na veliku znanstvenu bazu', 'et': 'KaFSP: Teadmistepõhine udune semantiline parsing vestlusküsimustele vastamiseks laiaulatusliku teabebaasi kaudu', 'fi': 'KaFSP: Knowledge-Aware sumea semanttinen jäsennys keskustelukysymyksiin vastaamiseen laajan tietopohjan kautta', 'sk': 'KaFSP: Zamegljeno semantično razčlenjevanje znanja za odgovore na pogovorna vprašanja v obsežni bazi znanja', 'he': 'KaFSP: בדיקת סמנטית מזויפת מודעת לשאלות משוחררות על בסיס ידע במידע גדול', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'KaWSP: knowknowknowness-Awake Fzzay semanti Parasing for conversations question respwering about a big-scale knowknowknowknowness baz', 'bo': 'KaFSP: Knowledge-Aware Fuzzy Semantic Parsing for Conversational Question Answering over a Large-Scale Knowledge Base'}
{'en': 'Progress with supervised Open Information Extraction (OpenIE) has been primarily limited to English due to the scarcity of training data in other languages. In this paper, we explore techniques to automatically convert English text for training OpenIE systems in other languages. We introduce the Alignment-Augmented Constrained Translation (AACTrans) model to translate English sentences and their corresponding extractions consistently with each other — with no changes to vocabulary or semantic meaning which may result from independent translations. Using the data generated with AACTrans, we train a novel two-stage generative OpenIE model, which we call Gen2OIE, that outputs for each sentence: 1) relations in the first stage and 2) all extractions containing the relation in the second stage. Gen2OIE increases relation coverage using a training data transformation technique that is generalizable to multiple languages, in contrast to existing models that use an English-specific training loss. Evaluations on 5 languages — Spanish, Portuguese, Chinese, Hindi and Telugu — show that the Gen2OIE with AACTrans data outperforms prior systems by a margin of 6-25% in F1.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، ندرس مسألتين من مناهج التحليل الدلالي لسؤال المحادثة الإجابة على قاعدة معرفية واسعة النطاق: (1) الإجراءات المحددة في القواعد ليست كافية للتعامل مع التفكير غير المؤكد الشائع في سيناريوهات العالم الحقيقي. (2) لم يتم استغلال معلومات قاعدة المعرفة بشكل جيد ودمجها في التحليل الدلالي. للتخفيف من هاتين المسألتين ، نقترح إطار تحليل لغوي غامض مدرك للمعرفة (KaFSP).\nيحدد عمليات المقارنة الغامضة في نظام القواعد للتفكير غير المؤكد بناءً على نظرية المجموعة الغامضة. من أجل تعزيز التفاعل بين التحليل الدلالي وقاعدة المعرفة ، نقوم بدمج ثلاث كيانات من قاعدة المعرفة في وحدة إزالة الغموض الخاصة بالكيان المدرك للمعرفة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقترح إطار عمل تصنيف متعدد العلامات ليس فقط لالتقاط الارتباطات بين أنواع الكيانات والعلاقات ولكن أيضًا للكشف عن معلومات قاعدة المعرفة ذات الصلة بالكلام الحالي. يعتمد كلا التعزيزين على نماذج لغة مُدرَّبة مسبقًا. توضح التجارب التي أجريت على معيار الإجابة على سؤال المحادثة على نطاق واسع أن KaFSP المقترح يحقق تحسينات كبيرة على النماذج الحديثة السابقة ، ويضع نتائج SOTA جديدة على 8 من أصل 10 أنواع من الأسئلة ، ويحقق تحسينات تزيد عن 10٪ F1 أو دقة على 3 أنواع من الأسئلة ، وتحسين F1 العام من 83.01٪ إلى 85.33٪. الكود المصدري لـ KaFSP متاح على https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions deux aspects des approches d'analyse sémantique pour répondre à des questions conversationnelles sur une base de connaissances à grande échelle\xa0: (1) Les actions définies dans la grammaire ne sont pas suffisantes pour traiter un raisonnement incertain courant dans les scénarios du monde réel. (2) Les informations de la base de connaissances ne sont pas bien exploitées et intégré dans l'analyse sémantique. Pour atténuer ces deux problèmes, nous proposons un framework d'analyse sémantique floue sensible aux connaissances (KafSP). \nIl définit des opérations de comparaison floue dans le système grammatical pour un raisonnement incertain basé sur la théorie des ensembles flous. Afin d'améliorer l'interaction entre l'analyse sémantique et la base de connaissances, nous intégrons des triplets d'entités de la base de connaissances dans un module de désambiguïsation des entités conscient des connaissances. En outre, nous proposons un cadre de classification multi-étiquettes pour non seulement capturer les corrélations entre les types d'entités et les relations, mais également détecter les informations de la base de connaissances pertinentes pour l'énoncé actuel. Les deux améliorations sont basées sur des modèles linguistiques préformés. Des expériences sur un banc de référence conversationnel à grande échelle pour répondre aux questions démontrent que le KaSFP proposé apporte des améliorations significatives par rapport aux modèles de pointe précédents, établissant de nouveaux résultats SOTA sur 8 types de questions sur 10, obtenant des améliorations de plus de 10\xa0% F1 ou une précision sur 3 types de questions, et amélioration de la F1 globale de 83,01\xa0% à 85,33\xa0%. Le code source de KafSP est disponible à l'adresse https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP.", 'es': 'En este artículo, estudiamos dos cuestiones de los enfoques de análisis semántico para responder a preguntas conversacionales en una base de conocimiento a gran escala: (1) Las acciones definidas en la gramática no son suficientes para manejar el razonamiento incierto común en escenarios del mundo real. (2) La información de la base de conocimiento no está bien explotada y incorporado en el análisis semántico. Para mitigar los dos problemas, proponemos un marco de análisis semántico difuso (KAFSP) consciente del conocimiento. \nDefine operaciones de comparación difusa en el sistema gramatical para un razonamiento incierto basado en la teoría de conjuntos difusos. Para mejorar la interacción entre el análisis semántico y la base de conocimientos, incorporamos triples de entidades de la base de conocimientos en un módulo de desambiguación de entidades consciente del conocimiento. Además, proponemos un marco de clasificación de múltiples etiquetas para no solo capturar las correlaciones entre los tipos de entidades y las relaciones, sino también para detectar información de la base de conocimientos relevante para el enunciado actual. Ambas mejoras se basan en modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados. Los experimentos en un punto de referencia de respuesta a preguntas conversacionales a gran escala demuestran que el KAFSP propuesto logra mejoras significativas con respecto a los modelos anteriores de última generación, estableciendo nuevos resultados SOTA en 8 de 10 tipos de preguntas, obteniendo mejoras de más del 10% F1 o precisión en 3 tipos de preguntas, y mejorando la F1 global del 83,01% al 85,33%. El código fuente de KAFSP está disponible en https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, estudamos duas questões de abordagens de análise semântica para responder perguntas conversacionais em uma base de conhecimento em larga escala: (1) As ações definidas na gramática não são suficientes para lidar com o raciocínio incerto comum em cenários do mundo real. (2) As informações da base de conhecimento não são bem exploradas e incorporadas à análise semântica. Para mitigar os dois problemas, propomos um framework de análise semântica fuzzy consciente do conhecimento (KaFSP).\nEle define operações de comparação fuzzy no sistema gramatical para raciocínio incerto baseado na teoria dos conjuntos fuzzy. A fim de melhorar a interação entre análise semântica e base de conhecimento, incorporamos triplos de entidade da base de conhecimento em um módulo de desambiguação de entidade ciente de conhecimento. Além disso, propomos uma estrutura de classificação multi-rótulo para não apenas capturar correlações entre tipos de entidades e relações, mas também detectar informações da base de conhecimento relevantes para o enunciado atual. Ambos os aprimoramentos são baseados em modelos de linguagem pré-treinados. Experimentos em um benchmark de resposta a perguntas conversacionais em larga escala demonstram que o KaFSP proposto alcança melhorias significativas em relação aos modelos de última geração anteriores, definindo novos resultados SOTA em 8 de 10 tipos de perguntas, obtendo melhorias de mais de 10% F1 ou precisão em 3 tipos de perguntas e melhorando a F1 geral de 83,01% para 85,33%. O código fonte do KaFSP está disponível em https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP.', 'zh': '本文中,究大知识库对语义解析法二事:(1)语法义不足以处世不定推理。 (2)知识库信息无良利,亦不入语义解析中。 为此二者,发一知识模糊语义解析框架(KaFSP)。 \n其定义基于模糊集合论不定推理者语法统中模糊较运算。 强语义解析知识库之交,合知识库三元而消歧义模块之。 又多标类框架,不惟得其实相关性,检其知识库息。 此二者,皆先训之言也。 大会话问准之实验,KaFSP显于前,设新于108,新SOTA于3,得过于10%F1准确性,F1于83.01%至于85.33%。 KaFSP之源代码可得于 https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP 。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम बड़े पैमाने पर ज्ञान के आधार पर संवादी प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग दृष्टिकोण के दो मुद्दों का अध्ययन करते हैं: (1) व्याकरण में परिभाषित क्रियाएं वास्तविक दुनिया के परिदृश्यों में आम अनिश्चित तर्क को संभालने के लिए पर्याप्त नहीं हैं। (2) नॉलेज बेस जानकारी का अच्छी तरह से शोषण नहीं किया जाता है और शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग में शामिल किया जाता है। दो मुद्दों को कम करने के लिए, हम एक ज्ञान-जागरूक फजी सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग फ्रेमवर्क (KaFSP) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। \nयह अस्पष्ट सेट सिद्धांत के आधार पर अनिश्चित तर्क के लिए व्याकरण प्रणाली में अस्पष्ट तुलना संचालन को परिभाषित करता है। सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग और नॉलेज बेस के बीच बातचीत को बढ़ाने के लिए, हम नॉलेज बेस से एंटिटी ट्रिपल्स को ज्ञान-जागरूक एंटिटी डिसविग्जुएशन मॉड्यूल में शामिल करते हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम न केवल इकाई प्रकारों और संबंधों के बीच सहसंबंधों को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, बल्कि वर्तमान उच्चारण के लिए प्रासंगिक ज्ञान आधार जानकारी का भी पता लगाते हैं। दोनों संवर्द्धन पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल पर आधारित हैं। एक बड़े पैमाने पर संवादी प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले बेंचमार्क पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित KaFSP पिछले अत्याधुनिक मॉडलों पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है, 10 प्रश्न प्रकारों में से 8 पर नए SOTA परिणामों की स्थापना करता है, 10% से अधिक F1 या 3 प्रश्न प्रकारों पर सटीकता में सुधार करता है, और 83.01% से 85.33% तक समग्र F1 में सुधार करता है। KaFSP का स्रोत कोड https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы изучаем два вопроса семантического синтаксического анализа подходов к ответу на разговорный вопрос через крупномасштабную базу знаний: (1) действия, определенные в грамматике, не достаточны для обработки неопределенного мышления, распространенного в реальных сценариях. (2) Информация базы знаний недостаточно хорошо используется и включается в семантический синтаксический анализ. Чтобы смягчить эти две проблемы, мы предлагаем нечеткую структуру семантического анализа, основанную на знаниях (KaFSP). \nОн определяет операции нечеткого сравнения в грамматической системе для неопределенного рассуждения, основанного на теории нечеткого множества. Чтобы усилить взаимодействие между семантическим синтаксическим анализом и базой знаний, мы включаем тройки сущностей из базы знаний в модуль разобщения сущностей, основанный на знаниях. Кроме того, мы предлагаем многоуровневую структуру классификации, чтобы не только фиксировать корреляции между типами сущностей и отношениями, но и обнаруживать информацию базы знаний, относящуюся к текущему высказыванию. Оба улучшения основаны на предварительно подготовленных языковых моделях. Эксперименты с крупномасштабными ответами на вопросы показывают, что предлагаемый KaFSP достигает значительных улучшений по сравнению с предыдущими современными моделями, устанавливая новые результаты SOTA по 8 из 10 типов вопросов, получая улучшения более чем на 10% F1 или точность по 3 типам вопросов, и улучшая в целом F1 с 83,01% до 85,33%. Исходный код KaFSP доступен по адресу https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP.', 'ja': 'この論文では、大規模な知識ベースでの会話的質問に対するセマンティック構文解析のアプローチの2つの問題を研究している。(1)文法で定義されたアクションは、現実のシナリオで一般的な不確実な推論を扱うのに十分ではない。(2)知識ベースの情報がうまく活用されておらず、セマンティック構文解析に組み込まれていない。 2つの問題を軽減するために、知識を認識するファジィ意味解析フレームワーク（ KaFSP ）を提案します。 \nこれは、ファジィ集合論に基づく不確実な推論のための文法システムにおけるファジィ比較演算を定義する。 セマンティック構文解析とナレッジベースの相互作用を強化するために、ナレッジベースからのエンティティトリプルをナレッジ認識エンティティの曖昧さ解消モジュールに組み込んでいます。 さらに、エンティティタイプとリレーションシップ間の相関関係をキャプチャするだけでなく、現在の発話に関連するナレッジベース情報を検出するためのマルチラベル分類フレームワークを提案します。 両方の機能強化は、事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルに基づいています。 大規模な会話型質問回答ベンチマークの実験では、提案されたKaFSPは、従来の最先端モデルよりも大幅な改善を達成し、10種類の質問タイプのうち8種類に新しいSOTA結果を設定し、F 1の10 ％以上の改善または3種類の質問タイプの精度を獲得し、F 1全体を83.01 ％から85.33 ％に改善することが示されています。 KaFSPのソースコードはhttps://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSPで入手できます。', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar dhá shaincheist a bhaineann le cur chuige parsála shéimeantach maidir le freagairt ceisteanna comhrá ar bhonn mórscála eolais: (1) Ní leor na gníomhartha a shainmhínítear sa ghramadach chun réasúnaíocht neamhchinnte a láimhseáil atá coitianta i gcásanna sa saol fíor. (2) Ní shaothraítear go maith faisnéis bhunáite an eolais agus ní ionchorpraítear í sa pharsáil shéimeantach. Chun an dá shaincheist a mhaolú, molaimid creat parsála doiléir atá feasach ar an eolas (KaFSP).\nSainmhíníonn sé oibríochtaí comparáide doiléir sa chóras gramadaí ar mhaithe le réasúnaíocht éiginnte bunaithe ar theoiric na tacair doiléir. D'fhonn an t-idirghníomhú idir parsáil shéimeantach agus an bonn eolais a fheabhsú, ionchorpraímid triarachí aonáin ón mbonn eolais isteach i modúl dídhébhríochta aonáin atá feasach ar an eolas. Ina theannta sin, molaimid creat aicmithe illipéid ní hamháin chun comhghaolta idir cineálacha agus caidreamh eintiteas a ghabháil ach freisin chun faisnéis bhunachar eolais a bhrath atá ábhartha don chaint reatha. Tá an dá fheabhsúchán bunaithe ar mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thagarmharc mórscála um fhreagairt ceisteanna comhrá go mbaineann an KaFSP atá beartaithe feabhsuithe suntasacha amach thar na samhlacha úrscothacha roimhe seo, ag socrú torthaí nua SOTA ar 8 gcinn as 10 gcineál ceisteanna, ag fáil feabhsuithe os cionn 10% F1 nó cruinneas. ar 3 chineál ceiste, agus feabhas ar F1 iomlán ó 83.01% go 85.33%. Tá cód foinse KaFSP ar fáil ag https://github.com/tjunlp-lab/KaFSP.", 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε δύο ζητήματα σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης προσεγγίσεων για την απάντηση των ερωτήσεων συνομιλίας σε μια μεγάλης κλίμακας βάση γνώσης: (1) Οι ενέργειες που ορίζονται στη γραμματική δεν επαρκούν για να χειριστούν αβέβαιη συλλογιστική κοινή σε σενάρια πραγματικού κόσμου. (2) Οι πληροφορίες της βάσης γνώσης δεν αξιοποιούνται καλά και ενσωματώνονται στη σημασιολογική ανάλυση. Για να μετριάσουμε τα δύο ζητήματα, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο ανάλυσης γνώσεων (KaFSP).', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban a beszélgetési kérdések megválaszolásának szemantikai elemzési megközelítésének két kérdését tanulmányozzuk egy nagyszabású tudásbázison keresztül: (1) A nyelvtani tevékenységek nem elegendőek a valós forgatókönyvekben gyakori bizonytalan érvelés kezelésére. (2) A tudásbázis információit nem használják ki megfelelően, és beépítik a szemantikai elemzésbe. A két probléma enyhítése érdekében egy ismerettudatos fuzzy semantic parsing framework (KaFSP) javaslatot teszünk.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტიში, ჩვენ ვისწავლით ორი პრობლემები სმენტიკური პარასტის გარეშე კითხვის შესახებ, რომელიც დიდი მანძილური ცნობიერების ბაზის გარეშე: (1) გრამმარიაში განსაზღვრებული მოქმედები არ არის მსგავსი,  (2) მეცნიერების ბაზის ინფორმაცია არ არის კარგი გამოიყენებული და სემონტიკური პარასტიში შეყენებული. რომელიც ორი პრობლემების შემცირებისთვის, ჩვენ მივიღებთ ცნობიერი სემენტიკური პარამეტრიკური პრობლემა (KaFSP).', 'it': "In questo articolo, studiamo due questioni di analisi semantica degli approcci alla risposta alle domande conversazionali su una base di conoscenze su larga scala: (1) Le azioni definite nella grammatica non sono sufficienti a gestire ragionamenti incerti comuni negli scenari del mondo reale. (2) Le informazioni della base di conoscenza non sono ben sfruttate e incorporate nell'analisi semantica. Per mitigare i due problemi, proponiamo un framework di analisi semantica fuzzy (KaFSP) consapevole della conoscenza.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз семантикалық талдаудың екі мәселелерін зерттейміз, көп өлшемді білім негізінде жауап беретін сұрақтардың сұрақтарына жауап беретін сұрақтары: 1) Грамматикада анықталған әрекеттер шын әлемдік сценарияларында (2) Мәліметтердің негізгі мәліметі жақсы жұмыс істемейді және semantic талдау ішінде ендірілмейді. Екі мәселелерді көшірмелеу үшін білім-білім туралы семантикалық талдау бағдарламасын (KaFSP) ұсынамыз.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjame du semantinio analizavimo metodų klausimus, susijusius su konversacijos klausimų atsakymu plačiąja žinių baze: (1) Gramatikoje apibrėžtų veiksmų nepakanka neapibrėžtam tikrojo pasaulio scenarijumi bendram pagrįstumui spręsti. (2) Knowledge base information is not well exploited and incorporated into semantic parsing.  Siekiant sušvelninti šiuos du klausimus, siūlome žiniomis žinomą nepagrįstą semantinio analizavimo sistemą (KaFSP).', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari dua isu pendekatan penghuraian semantik kepada pertanyaan perbualan menjawab melalui pangkalan pengetahuan skala besar: (1) Tindakan yang ditakrif dalam grammar tidak cukup untuk menangani alasan yang tidak pasti biasa dalam skenario dunia nyata. (2) Maklumat asas pengetahuan tidak dieksploitasi dengan baik dan disertai dalam penghuraian semantik. Untuk mengurangi kedua-dua isu, kami melaporkan kerangka penghuraian semantik (KaFSP) yang tidak sedar pengetahuan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്റെ രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ബേസില്\u200d ഉത്തരം സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധാരണമുള്ള ചോദ് (2) അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നില്ല, സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിലേക്ക് ചേ ഈ രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d മുളപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അറിവുള്ള ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ക് ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറ് ചെയ്യുന്നു.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw żewġ kwistjonijiet ta’ approċċi semantiċi ta’ analiżi għall-mistoqsijiet ta’ konverżjoni li jwieġbu fuq bażi ta’ għarfien fuq skala kbira: (1) L-azzjonijiet definiti fil-grammar mhumiex biżżejjed biex jittrattaw raġunament in ċert komuni fix-xenarji tad-dinja reali. (2) L-informazzjoni bbażata fuq l-għarfien mhijiex sfruttata tajjeb u inkorporata fl-analiżi semantika. Biex jittaffew iż-żewġ kwistjonijiet, qed nipproponu qafas ta’ analiżijiet semantiċi bla għarfien (KaFSP).', 'mk': 'Во овој документ, ние студираме два прашања за семантични пристапи на анализирање на разговорите одговарајќи на прашања преку голема база на знаење: (1) Акциите дефинирани во граматиката не се доволни за да се справат со несигурното размислување заедничко во реалните сценарија. (2) Информациите за базата на знаење не се добро искористени и вклучени во семантичното анализирање. За да ги олесниме двата прашања, предлагаме нејасна семантична рамка за анализирање (KaFSP) на знаење.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy dwa zagadnienia analizy semantycznej do odpowiedzi na pytania konwersacyjne na dużej skali bazie wiedzy: (1) Działania zdefiniowane w gramatyce nie są wystarczające do obsługi niepewnego rozumowania powszechnego w scenariuszach rzeczywistych. (2) Informacje z bazy wiedzy nie są dobrze wykorzystywane i włączone do parsowania semantycznego. Aby złagodzić te dwa problemy, proponujemy świadomy wiedzę rozmyty framework parsowania semantycznego (KaFSP).', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид семантик хуваалцлагын хоёр асуудлыг судалж байлаа. Маш их хэмжээний мэдлэг суурь дээр хариулт асуултын тухай ярилцлага асуудлын тухай 2 асуудлыг судалж байлаа: (1) Грамматикт тодорхойлж байгаа үйл явдал бодит ертөнцийн (2) Мэдлэгийн суурь мэдээллийг сайн ашиглаж, semantic parsing-д оруулсан биш. Хоёр асуудлыг багасгахын тулд бид мэдлэг ойлгомжтой эмзэг semantic parsing framework (KaFSP) гэж санал болно.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, studiem două aspecte ale abordărilor de analizare semantică a răspunsurilor la întrebări conversaționale pe o bază de cunoștințe la scară largă: (1) Acțiunile definite în gramatică nu sunt suficiente pentru a gestiona raționamentul incert comun în scenariile din lumea reală. (2) Informațiile bazei de cunoștințe nu sunt bine exploatate și încorporate în analizarea semantică. Pentru a atenua cele două probleme, propunem un cadru de analizare semantică fuzzy conștient de cunoaștere (KaFSP).', 'no': 'I denne papiret studerer vi to problemer med semantisk tolking tilnærmingar til samtalespørsmålet som svarar over ein stor forståelse basen: (1) Handlingane definerte i grammatikk er ikkje nok for å handtera usikkerte rasjonar vanleg i verdens scenarior. (2) Kvitensbaseinformasjon er ikkje veldig eksplodert og inkludert i semantisk tolking. For å redusere dei to problema, foreslår vi ein kjennomsiktig feil semantisk tolking-rammeverk (KaFSP).', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo dva pitanja semantičkog razmatranja pristupa razgovornom pitanju, odgovarajući na veliku znanstvenu bazu: (1) Akcije definisane u gramatici nisu dovoljne za rješavanje neodređenih razloga zajedničkog u stvarnom svetskom scenariju. (2) Informacije o bazi znanja nisu dobro iskorištene i uključene u semantičko analiziranje. Da bi se smanjili dva pitanja, predlažemo sistem za razmatranje semantičkog razmatranja znanja (KaFSP).', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baranaynaa laba su'aalood oo ka mid ah baarlamaanka semantika si aan ugu jawaabno su'aalaha hadalka oo ka jawaabaya aasaaska aqoonta aad u weyn:(1) Shaqooyinka qoraalka lagu qoray ma filna in lagu xambaaro sababta aan la'aamin ee xaaladaha caalamiga ah ee halis ah. (2) Macluumaadka aasaasiga aqoontu si fiican looma isticmaalo oo laguma soo geliyo baarlamaanka semantika. Si loo fududeeyo labada arin, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qalabka aqoonta oo fudud baaritaanka semantic (KaFSP).", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats studerar vi två frågor om semantisk tolkning av konversationsfrågesvar över en storskalig kunskapsbas: (1) De åtgärder som definieras i grammatik är inte tillräckliga för att hantera osäkra resonemang vanliga i verkliga scenarier. (2) Kunskapsbasens information utnyttjas inte väl och införlivas inte i semantisk tolkning. För att mildra de två frågorna föreslår vi ett kunskapsmedvetet fuzzy semantic parsing framework (KaFSP).', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණයේ සෙමාන්ටික් පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා වැඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොකු විශ්වාසික දන්නවට ප්\u200dරශ (2) දැනගැනීමේ මූලික තොරතුරු හොඳටම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ නැහැ ඒ වගේම සෙමාන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණයේ සම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් අඩංගුවන්න, අපි දැනගන්න පුළුවන් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (KaFSP) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் இரண்டு பாடல் பற்றிய இரண்டு பிரச்சினைகளை படிக்கிறோம் பெரிய அளவு அறிவு தளத்திற்கு பதில் பேச வேண்டும் பேச்சு கேள்வி: (1) வரைபடத்தி (2) அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை தகவல் நன்றாக பயன்படுத்தப்படவில்லை மற்றும் சேர்க்கப்படவில்லை இந்த இரண்டு பிரச்சனைகளை முறைப்பதற்கு, நாம் அறிந்து கொள்ளும் தெரிந்து கொள்ளும் பெம்மான்டிக் பாடல் சட்டத்தை', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم دو مسائل کی تلاش کرتے ہیں جن میں سیمنٹی پارسینگ کے مطابق مکالمانی سوال کے مطابق ایک بڑے معلوم بنسس پر جواب دیتے ہیں: (1) گرامماری میں مقرر کیا ہوا کام حقیقی دنیا کی سناریوں میں غیر قطعی بحث کرنے کے لئے کافی نہیں ہیں۔ (2) علم base information is not well exploited and incorporated in semantic parsing. دو مسائل کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک علم واقف سیمنٹی پارسینگ فرم (KaFSP) کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz semantik parsing ikki muammolarni o'rganamiz, juda katta ta'minlovchi илм asosida javob berish uchun muloqat soʻzlariga javob beramiz:(1) grammatika aniqlangan amallar haqiqida ma'lum bo'lgan dunyodagi ko'paytlarni boshqarishga yetarli emas. (2) Maʼlumot bazasi maʼlumoti juda yaxshi ishlatilmaydi va semantik parsing bilan qoʻyilmaydi. Ikkita muammolarni kamaytirish uchun, biz ilmiy haqiqida xavfsiz semantik parsing frameiyasi (KaFSP) talab qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu hai vấn đề về cách phân tích theo ngữ pháp về các câu hỏi đối thoại trả lời trên một căn cứ kiến thức quy mô lớn: 1) Những hành động được xác định theo ngữ pháp không đủ để giải quyết các lý mơ hồ chung trong các viễn cảnh thế giới thực. (2) Thông tin về cơ sở tri thức không được khai thác tốt và nhập vào ngữ pháp phân tích. Để giảm thiểu hai vấn đề, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ chế phân tích mẫu màu lục lục dày hiểu biết (KaFSB).', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия се изучават два проблема на семантичния анализ на подходите на разговорния отговор на въпроси чрез широкомащабна база знания: (1) Действията, дефинирани в граматиката, не са достатъчни за справяне с несигурни разсъждения, често срещани в реалния свят сценарии. (2) Информацията от базата на знания не е добре експлоатирана и включена в семантичното анализиране. За да смекчим двата проблема, предлагаме ориентирана към знанието мъглива семантична рамка за анализ (KaFSP).', 'nl': "In dit artikel bestuderen we twee kwesties van semantische parsing benaderingen voor het beantwoorden van gespreksvragen via een grootschalige kennisbasis: (1) De acties gedefinieerd in grammatica zijn niet voldoende om onzekere redenering te verwerken die gebruikelijk is in real-world scenario's. (2) Kennisbasinformatie wordt niet goed benut en verwerkt in semantische parsing. Om de twee problemen te verzachten, stellen we een kennisbewust fuzzy semantisch parsing framework (KaFSP) voor.", 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi to spørgsmål om semantisk parsing tilgange til konversationsspørgsmål besvarelse over en stor vidensbase: (1) Handlingerne defineret i grammatik er ikke tilstrækkelige til at håndtere usikker ræsonnement almindelig i virkelighedens scenarier. (2) Videnbaseoplysninger udnyttes ikke godt og indarbejdes i semantisk fortolkning. For at afhjælpe de to problemer foreslår vi en vidensbevidst fuzzy semantisk parsing framework (KaFSP).', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo dva pitanja semantičkog analiza pristupa razgovornom pitanju koji odgovara na veliku znanstvenu bazu: (1) Akcije definirane u gramatici nisu dovoljne za rješavanje neodređenih razloga zajedničkih u scenarijima stvarnog svijeta. (2) Informacije o bazi znanja nisu dobro iskorištene i uključene u semantičko analiziranje. Da bi se smanjili dva pitanja, predlažemo sistem za razmatranje semantičkog razmatranja svjesnog znanja (KaFSP).', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir zwei Aspekte der semantischen Parsing-Ansätze zur Beantwortung von Gesprächsfragen über eine große Wissensbasis: (1) Die in der Grammatik definierten Handlungen reichen nicht aus, um unsichere Argumente zu handhaben, die in realen Szenarien üblich sind. (2) Informationen aus der Wissensdatenbank werden nicht gut genutzt und in semantisches Parsing integriert. Um die beiden Probleme zu mildern, schlagen wir ein wissensbewusstes Fuzzy Semantic Parsing Framework (KaFSP) vor.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari dua isu pendekatan penghuraian semantis untuk pertanyaan konversasi menjawab melalui dasar pengetahuan skala besar: (1) tindakan yang didefinisikan dalam gramatika tidak cukup untuk menangani alasan tidak pasti yang umum dalam skenario dunia nyata. (2) Informasi dasar pengetahuan tidak dieksploitasi dengan baik dan dimasukkan ke dalam penghuraian semantis. Untuk mengurangi kedua masalah, kami mengusulkan rangkaian penghuraian semantis (KaFSP) yang berasal dari pengetahuan.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 대규모 지식 라이브러리에서 회화 문답의 의미 분석 방법의 두 가지 문제를 연구했다. (1) 문법에서 정의된 동작은 현실 장면에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 불확실성 추리를 처리하기에 부족하다.(2) 지식 라이브러리 정보가 잘 활용되지 못하고 의미 분석에 잘 융합되지 못했다.이 두 문제를 완화하기 위해 우리는 지식 감지의 모호한 의미 분석 구조(KaFSP)를 제시했다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما دو مسئله تحقیق می\u200cکنیم از دسترسی\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cگیری semantic به سوال مکالمه\u200cای که پاسخ داده می\u200cشود بر روی یک پایگاه دانش بسیار بزرگ: (۱) عمل\u200cهایی که توسط گرم\u200cشناسی تعریف شده\u200cاند کافی نیستند که در سیناریو\u200cهای جهانی واقعی در نظر مش (2) اطلاعات بنیادی دانش به خوبی استفاده نمی\u200cشود و در تجزیه\u200cهای semantic incorporated into semantic parsing. برای تنگ کردن دو مسائل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی semantic (KaFSP) بی\u200cخبر از دانش باشیم.', 'sw': 'In this paper, we study two issues of semantic parsing approaches to conversational question answering over a large-scale knowledge base: (1) The actions defined in grammar are not sufficient to handle uncertain reasoning common in real-world scenarios.  (2) taarifa za msingi za maarifa hazitumiwi vizuri na inajumuisha kwenye mabunge ya sekunde. Ili kupunguza masuala haya mawili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa uchimbaji wa kimapenzi unaofahamika na maarifa (KaFSP).', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, semantik parslamak üçin 2 mesele uly bir bilim üssünde jogap berilýän görüşme soragynyň golaýyny öwrenýärdik: (1) gramatika definilýän hereketleriň hakyky dünýä senaryýalarda kesinliksiz sebäpleri çykmak üçin ýeterli däl. (2) Bilim tabasy maglumaty gowy ulanmaýar we semantik parsasyna dahil edilmez. Iki meseleni azaltmak üçin bilim bilen kellän bir semantik parslama çerçevesini (KaFSP) teklip edýäris.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë dy çështje të metodave semantike të analizimit të pyetjeve të bisedimeve që përgjigjen mbi një bazë njohurie në shkallë të madhe: (1) Veprimet e përcaktuara në gramatikë nuk janë të mjaftueshme për të trajtuar arsyetimin e pasigurt të përbashkët në skenarët e botës reale. (2) Informacioni bazë i njohurive nuk shfrytëzohet dhe përfshihet mirë në analizimin semantik. Për të lehtësuar të dy çështjet, ne propozojmë një kuadër analizimi semantik të ngatërruar (KaFSP) në dijeni.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons twee aangeleenthede van semantiese verwerking toegang tot omskakelike vraag antwoord oor 'n groot-skaal kennisbasis: (1) Die aksies gedefinieerde in grammatiek is nie genoeg om onverseker redening gemeenskaplik in reël-wêreld scenarios te hanteer nie. (2) kennis basis inligting is nie goed uitgebruik en ingesluit in semantiese verwerking nie. Om die twee aangeleenthede te verminder, voorstel ons 'n kennis-kennis-bevestig fuzzy semantiese verwerking raamwerk (KaFSP).", 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት፣ ሁለት የsemantic ፓርቲ ጉዳይ ላይ በተለየ ትልቅ እውቀት መቀመጫን ለመቀበል የሚቃወም ጥያቄን እናስተምራለን:(1) በgrammar የተዘረዘ ትግባሮች እውነተኛ ዓለማዊ እውቀት በተቃውሞ ማስታወቂያ አይበቃቸውም፡፡ (2) የእውቀት መቀመጫዎች መረጃዎች በክፍል የተጠቃሚ እና ወደ semantic ማዘጋጀት አይጠቅሙም፡፡ To mitigate the two issues, we propose a knowledge-aware fuzzy semantic parsing framework (KaFSP).', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու խնդիր, որոնք վերաբերվում են սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մոտեցումներին հաղորդակցման հարցերին, որոնք պատասխանում են մեծ մասշտաբ գիտելիքների հիմքի վրա: (1) Գրագրաֆիկայում սահմանված գործողությունները բավարար չեն իրական աշխարհի սցենա (2) Գիտության հիմնական տեղեկատվությունը լավ չի օգտագործվում և չի ներառվում սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մեջ: Երկու խնդիրները նվազեցնելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք գիտելիքի գիտակցական սևմանտիկ վերլուծության (ԿաֆՍՊ) շրջանակ:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, iki semantik ayırma məsələsinin çox ölçülü bilgi bazı ilə cavab verən müzakirə sualına yaxınlaşdığı məsələlər təhsil edirik: (1) Grammatikada tanımlanan işlər gerçek dünya senaryolarında müəyyən müzakirə müzakirə olmaq üçün kifayət deyildir. (2) Bilim bazı məlumatları çox gözəl istifadə edilməz və semantik ayırmağa daxil edilməz. İki məsələni azaltmaq üçün bilikli bir semantik ayırma framework ü (KaFSP) təklif edirik.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং এর দুটি বিষয় গবেষণা করছি যেখানে আলোচনার প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়া হয়েছে বিশাল পর্যায়ে জ্ঞানের বেসের উপরে: (১) গ্রামারে নির্ধা (2) জ্ঞানের বেস তথ্য ভালো ব্যবহার করা হয় না এবং সেমেন্টিক পার্জিং এ যোগাযোগ করা হয় না। এই দুটি বিষয়গুলোকে কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য, আমরা জ্ঞান-পরিচিত এক অজ্ঞাত সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং ফ্রেম্যাকের প্রস্তাব করছি।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo dva pitanja semantičkog razmatranja pristupa razgovornom pitanju koja odgovara na veliku znanstvenu bazu: (1) Akcije definirane u gramatici nisu dovoljne da se rješavaju neodređeni razumni zajednički u stvarnom svetskom scenariju. (2) Informacije o bazi znanja nisu dobro iskorištene i uključene u semantičko analizu. Da bi se smanjili dva pitanja, predlažemo sistem za razmatranje semantičkog razmatranja znanja (KaFSP).', 'ca': "En aquest paper estudiem dos temes d'abords semàntics d'analització de preguntes conversacionals responent a una base de coneixements a gran escala: (1) Les accions definides en la gramàtica no són suficients per gestionar raonament incert comú en escenaris del món real. (2) La informació basal del coneixement no està ben explotada i incorporada en l'analització semàntica. Per mitigar les dues qüestions, proposem un marc d'analització semàntica confus (KaFSP) conscient del coneixement.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme dvěma problematikami sémantické parsing přístupů k odpovědi konverzačních otázek na rozsáhlé znalostní bázi: (1) Akce definované v gramatice nestačí k řešení nejistého uvažování běžného v reálném světě. (2) Informace znalostní báze nejsou dobře využívány a začleněny do sémantického parsování. Pro zmírnění těchto dvou problémů navrhujeme vědomostní fuzzy sémantický parsing framework (KaFSP).', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime kahte semantilise parsimise lähenemisviisi teemat vestlusküsimustele vastamiseks laiaulatusliku teadmistebaasi kaudu: (1) Grammatikas määratletud tegevused ei ole piisavad ebakindlate arutluste käsitlemiseks reaalsetes stsenaariumides. (2) Teabebaasi teavet ei kasutata hästi ära ja see on semantilises parsimises inkorporeeritud. Nende kahe probleemi leevendamiseks pakume välja teadmistepõhise häguse semantilise parsimisraamistiku (KaFSP).', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan kahta semanttisen jäsentämisen lähestymistapaa keskustelukysymyksiin laajassa tietopohjassa: (1) Kieliopissa määritellyt toimet eivät riitä käsittelemään epävarmaa päättelyä, joka on yleinen todellisissa skenaarioissa. (2) Tietotietokannan tietoja ei hyödynnetä hyvin eikä niitä sisällytetä semanttiseen jäsentämiseen. Näiden kahden ongelman lieventämiseksi ehdotamme tietotietoista sumeaa semanttista jäsennyskehystä (KaFSP).', 'jv': 'Nang paper iki, kita isih basa perusahaan kelas sematik iki dadi pangusahaan langkung nggawe gerakan ingkang dipatenong sing larang langkung banjur (1) Kasunyatan kanggo ngerasakno ning kelas perusahaan sing ora ono wektu nggawe gerakan tanggal nggawe ketahan ora iso dianggawe gerakan sing perusahaan anyar-uwong. (2) Bilih baz informasi ora luwih basa sakjane bukewang kelas karo semanti terus. Ngawe nggunakake iki seneng luwih-luwih dumadhi, kita supoyo nggawe kesalahan kelas semanti nggawe barang kelas (KaWSP).', 'sk': 'V prispevku preučujemo dve vprašanji semantičnega razčlenjevanja pristopov k odgovoru na pogovorna vprašanja v obsežni bazi znanja: (1) Dejanja, opredeljena v slovnici, niso dovolj za obravnavanje negotovega razmišljanja, ki je običajno v realnih scenarijih. (2) Informacije iz baze znanja niso dobro izkoriščene in vključene v semantično razčlenjevanje. Za ublažitev obeh vprašanj predlagamo znanje ozaveščen mezzy semantic parsing framework (KaFSP).', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו לומדים שני נושאים של גישות מעבדה סמנטית לשאלות שיחה שעובדות על בסיס ידע ברמה גדולה: (1) הפעולות המוגדרות בגרמטיקה אינן מספיקות כדי להתמודד עם הגיון לא בטוח משותף בתנאים של עולם אמיתי. (2) מידע על בסיס הידע לא ניצל היטב ומקביל לאבחן סמנטי. כדי להקל על שני הנושאים, אנו מציעים מסגרת מעבדה סמנטית מודעת למידע (KaFSP).', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takarda, Munã karanta masu biyu na masu cikin parse na semantiki zuwa matabbata ga masu yin magana a kan masu tambayar da ke karɓa a kan basin ilmi mai girma:(1) Ayuka da aka ƙayyade cikin grammar ba ya isa ga manfaci masu da ba'a sani ba a cikin fassarar-duniya. (2) Ba'a amfani da shi ba da kuma a haɗa shi cikin parse na semantic. To, domin cire masu biyu, Munã goyyar da wani firam mai sano mai fassara na semantic (KaFSP).", 'bo': 'In this paper, we study two issues of semantic parsing approaches to conversational question answering over a large-scale knowledge base: (1) The actions defined in grammar are not sufficient to handle uncertain reasoning common in real-world scenarios. (2) ཤེས་རིག་གི་གཞི་གནས་ཚུལ་དེ་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་མེད་པར། རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དོན་ལྟར་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་བ། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་བཀོད་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Text-to-Table: A New Way of Information Extraction', 'ar': 'إكمال الرسم البياني المعرفي متعدد اللغات باستخدام محاذاة الرسم البياني التكيفية الخاضعة للإشراف الذاتي', 'es': 'Finalización de gráficos de conocimiento multilingüe con alineación de gráficos adaptativa autosupervisada', 'pt': 'Conclusão do gráfico de conhecimento multilíngue com alinhamento de gráfico adaptável autossupervisionado', 'fr': 'Complétion de graphes de connaissances multilingues avec alignement adaptatif auto-supervisé', 'ja': '自主監修のアダプティブグラフアライメントを使用した多言語ナレッジグラフの完了', 'hi': 'स्व-पर्यवेक्षित अनुकूली ग्राफ संरेखण के साथ बहुभाषी ज्ञान ग्राफ़ पूरा करना', 'ru': 'Завершение многоязычного графа знаний с самоконтролируемым адаптивным выравниванием графа', 'zh': '有自督自适图对齐功能多言知图谱成', 'ga': 'Críochnú Grafa Faisnéise Ilteangacha le hAilíniúchán Graf Oiriúnaitheach Féinmhaoirsithe', 'ka': 'Multilingual Knowledge Graph Completion with Self-Supervised Adaptive Graph Alignment', 'el': 'Ολοκλήρωση πολύγλωσσων γραφικών γνώσεων με αυτοεποπτική προσαρμοστική ευθυγράμμιση γραφικών', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű tudásgraf kiegészítés önfelügyeleti adaptív grafikaigazítással', 'it': 'Completamento multilingue del grafico della conoscenza con allineamento adattivo auto-supervisionato', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbis žinių grafiko užbaigimas su savarankiškai prižiūrimu prisitaikymo grafiko suderinimu', 'mk': 'Повеќејазично комплетирање на графикот со самонадгледувано адаптивно прилагодување на графикот', 'kk': 'Көптілік білім графикалық өзінің бақылау адаптификалық графикалық туралауымен толтыру', 'ms': 'Penyempurnaan Graf Pengetahuan Berbahasa dengan Jajaran Graf Adaptif Dipengawasi Sendiri', 'ml': 'സ്വയം പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട അഡാപ്റ്റിവ് ഗ്രാഫ് ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നതിനൊപ്പം പല ഭാഷകളുടെ അറിവ് ഗ്ര', 'mt': 'Tlestija ta’ Grafika ta’ Għarfien Multilingwi b’Allinjament ta’ Grafika Adattattiva Awto-Sorveljata', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний мэдлэг графикийн төгсгөл нь Өөрөө дамжуулан дамжуулагч график туйлбарлалттай', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne uzupełnianie wykresu wiedzy z samodzielnym nadzorem adaptacyjnym wyrównaniem wykresu', 'ro': 'Completarea graficului de cunoștințe multilingv cu aliniere adaptivă auto-supravegheată a graficului', 'no': 'Fullføring av fleirspråk kjennende graf med sjølvovervåka tilpassande grafikkjustering', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාත්මක දන්න ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්පූර්ණය සමග ස්වයංග්\u200dරාෆ් සැකසුම් සැකසුම් සැකසුම් සැකස', 'so': 'Horumarinta aqoonta luuqadaha kala duduwan', 'sv': 'Kompletterande flerspråkig kunskapsgraf med självövervakad adaptiv grafjustering', 'sr': 'Završavanje višejezičkih znanja grafika sa samopouzdanim adaptivnim propisanjem grafika', 'ta': 'தன்னியக்கமாக பார்க்கப்பட்ட Adaptive Graph ஒழுங்குபடுத்தப்பட்ட பல மொழி அறிவு வரைகலை முடிவு', 'ur': 'Multilingual Knowledge Graph Completion with Self-Supervised Adaptive Graph Alignment', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Hình thức rộng Name', 'bg': 'Завършване на многоезична графика на знанието със самоконтролирано адаптивно подравняване на графиката', 'da': 'Flersproget viden graf fuldførelse med selv-overvåget adaptiv grafjustering', 'nl': 'Meertalige kennisgrafiek voltooien met zelfbegeleide adaptieve grafiekuitlijning', 'hr': 'Završenje višejezičkih znanstvenih grafika sa samoočuvanim adaptivnim napravom grafika', 'de': 'Vervollständigung mehrsprachiger Wissensdiagramme mit selbstüberwachter adaptiver Diagrammausrichtung', 'id': 'Penyempurnaan Graf Pengetahuan Berbahasa dengan Jajaran Graf Adaptif DiSupervisi Sendiri', 'fa': 'تعمیر گراف دانش\u200cهای زیادی زبان با تنظیم گراف قابل تحت نظر خود', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa ufahamu wa lugha nyingi na Uchambaji wa Graph', 'ko': '자체 감독을 바탕으로 자체 적응도를 맞추는 다언어 지식도 완비', 'tr': 'Öz Gözlemli Görniş Opşenler Grafik Täzelikleri bilen Çot Dilli Bilgi Grafik Tamamlamasy', 'af': 'Veelvuldige kennis Graf Voltooiïng met Selfbeheerde Adaptief Graf Oplyn', 'sq': 'Plotësimi i grafikut të njohurive shumëgjuhëse me rregullimin e grafikut adaptues të mbikqyrur vetë', 'hy': 'Multilingual Knowledge Graph Completion with Self-Supervised Adaptive Graph Alignment', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil Bilim Grafiki Öz Gözləşdirilmiş Adaptiv Grafik İzləməsi ilə tamamlama', 'bn': 'Multilingual Knowledge Graph Completion with Self-Supervised Adaptive Graph Alignment', 'ca': 'Completació multilingüe del gràfic del coneixement amb alliniament adaptatiu', 'cs': 'Dokončení vícejazyčného znalostního grafu s vlastním dohledem adaptivním zarovnáním grafů', 'bs': 'Završenje višejezičkih znanstvenih grafika sa samopouzdanim adaptivnim popravkom grafika', 'et': 'Mitmekeelse teadmiste graafiku lõpetamine enesejärelevalvega kohanduva graafiku joondamisega', 'fi': 'Monikielinen tietokaavion viimeistely itsevalvotulla adaptiivisella kaavion linjauksella', 'jv': 'Multilanguang Bilge Graph Komplit karo Self-super-Vised Adjustable Graph Align', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Večjezično zaključevanje grafikona znanja s samonadzorovano prilagodljivo poravnavo grafikona', 'he': 'סיום גרף מידע רבולוגי עם התאמת גרף משגיחה עצמית', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་འགའ་སྐུལ་གྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཚོགས་ཀྱིས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་ཀློག་བྱེད་པའི་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'We study a new problem setting of information extraction (IE), referred to as text-to-table. In text-to-table, given a text, one creates a table or several tables expressing the main content of the text, while the model is learned from text-table pair data. The problem setting differs from those of the existing methods for IE. First, the extraction can be carried out from long texts to large tables with complex structures. Second, the extraction is entirely data-driven, and there is no need to explicitly define the schemas. As far as we know, there has been no previous work that studies the problem. In this work, we formalize text-to-table as a sequence-to-sequence (seq2seq) problem. We first employ a seq2seq model fine-tuned from a pre-trained language model to perform the task. We also develop a new method within the seq2seq approach, exploiting two additional techniques in table generation: table constraint and table relation embeddings. We consider text-to-table as an inverse problem of the well-studied table-to-text, and make use of four existing table-to-text datasets in our experiments on text-to-table. Experimental results show that the vanilla seq2seq model can outperform the baseline methods of using relation extraction and named entity extraction. The results also show that our method can further boost the performances of the vanilla seq2seq model. We further discuss the main challenges of the proposed task. The code and data are available at https://github.com/shirley-wu/text_to_table.', 'ar': 'يعد التنبؤ بالحقائق المفقودة في الرسم البياني المعرفي (KG) أمرًا بالغ الأهمية لأن مدارس رياض الأطفال الحديثة بعيدة عن الاكتمال. بسبب وضع العلامات البشرية كثيفة العمالة ، تتدهور هذه الظاهرة عند التعامل مع المعرفة الممثلة بلغات مختلفة. في هذه الورقة ، نستكشف إكمال رياض الأطفال بلغات متعددة ، والذي يعزز محاذاة البذور المحدودة كجسر ، لاحتضان المعرفة الجماعية من لغات متعددة. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال محاذاة اللغة المستخدمة في الأعمال السابقة غير مستغلة بالكامل: (1) يتم التعامل مع أزواج المحاذاة على قدم المساواة لدفع الكيانات المتوازية إلى أقصى حد لتكون قريبة ، مما يتجاهل عدم اتساق سعة KG ؛ (2) اصطفاف البذور نادر وعادة ما يكون تحديد المحاذاة الجديد بطريقة غير خاضعة للرقابة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لمحاذاة الرسم البياني التكيفية (SS-AGA) تحت الإشراف الذاتي. على وجه التحديد ، تدمج SS-AGA جميع KGs كرسم بياني كامل من خلال اعتبار المحاذاة نوع حافة جديد. على هذا النحو ، يمكن التحكم في انتشار المعلومات وتأثير الضوضاء عبر KGs بشكل تكيفي من خلال أوزان الانتباه المدرك للعلاقة. وفي الوقت نفسه ، يتميز SS-AGA بمولد زوج جديد يلتقط ديناميكيًا أزواج المحاذاة المحتملة في نموذج يتم الإشراف عليه ذاتيًا. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على كل من DBPedia KG العامة متعددة اللغات والتجارة الإلكترونية الصناعية متعددة اللغات التي تم إنشاؤها حديثًا ، بشكل تجريبي فعالية SS-AGA', 'pt': 'Prever fatos ausentes em um gráfico de conhecimento (KG) é crucial, pois os KGs modernos estão longe de serem completos. Devido à rotulagem humana trabalhosa, esse fenômeno se deteriora ao lidar com o conhecimento representado em várias línguas. Neste artigo, exploramos a conclusão de KG multilíngue, que aproveita o alinhamento limitado de sementes como uma ponte para abraçar o conhecimento coletivo de vários idiomas. No entanto, o alinhamento de linguagem usado em trabalhos anteriores ainda não é totalmente explorado: (1) os pares de alinhamento são tratados igualmente para aproximar ao máximo as entidades paralelas, o que ignora a inconsistência da capacidade KG; (2) o alinhamento de sementes é escasso e a identificação de novos alinhamentos geralmente ocorre de maneira ruidosa e não supervisionada. Para resolver esses problemas, propomos um novo método de alinhamento de grafos adaptativos auto-supervisionados (SS-AGA). Especificamente, o SS-AGA funde todos os KGs como um gráfico inteiro considerando o alinhamento como um novo tipo de aresta. Como tal, a propagação de informações e a influência do ruído nos KGs podem ser controladas de forma adaptativa por meio de pesos de atenção conscientes da relação. Enquanto isso, o SS-AGA apresenta um novo gerador de pares que captura dinamicamente os pares de alinhamento em um paradigma autossupervisionado. Extensos experimentos tanto no DBPedia KG multilíngue público quanto no recém-criado E-commerce multilíngue industrial KG demonstram empiricamente a eficácia do SS-AGA', 'fr': "Prédire les faits manquants dans un graphe de connaissances (KG) est crucial car les KG modernes sont loin d'être complets. En raison de l'étiquetage humain à forte intensité de main-d'œuvre, ce phénomène s'aggrave lorsque l'on manipule des connaissances représentées dans différentes langues. Dans cet article, nous explorons la complétion multilingue de KG, qui tire parti de l'alignement limité des semences comme pont, pour intégrer les connaissances collectives de plusieurs langues. Cependant, l'alignement du langage utilisé dans les travaux antérieurs n'est toujours pas pleinement exploité\xa0: (1) les paires d'alignement sont traitées de la même manière pour pousser au maximum les entités parallèles à être proches, ce qui ignore l'incohérence de capacité KG\xa0; (2) l'alignement des graines est rare et les nouvelles identifications d'alignement se font généralement d'une manière bruyamment non supervisée. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode d'alignement de graphe adaptatif auto-supervisé (SS-AGA). Plus précisément, SS-AGA fusionne tous les KG dans un graphique complet en considérant l'alignement comme un nouveau type d'arête. Ainsi, la propagation de l'information et l'influence du bruit entre les KG peuvent être contrôlées de manière adaptative via des pondérations d'attention sensibles aux relations. Par ailleurs, SS-AGA dispose d'un nouveau générateur de paires qui capture dynamiquement les paires d'alignement potentielles dans un paradigme auto-supervisé. Des expériences approfondies sur le DBpedia KG multilingue public et le nouveau E-commerce multilingue industriel KG démontrent empiriquement l'efficacité de SS-AGA", 'es': 'Predecir los hechos faltantes en un gráfico de conocimiento (KG) es crucial, ya que los KG modernos distan mucho de estar completos. Debido al uso intensivo de mano de obra del etiquetado humano, este fenómeno se deteriora cuando se manejan los conocimientos representados en varios idiomas. En este artículo, exploramos la realización multilingüe de KG, que aprovecha la alineación limitada de semillas como puente, para abrazar el conocimiento colectivo de varios idiomas. Sin embargo, la alineación del lenguaje utilizada en trabajos anteriores aún no se explota completamente: (1) los pares de alineación se tratan por igual para empujar al máximo a las entidades paralelas para que se acerquen, lo que ignora la inconsistencia de la capacidad de KG; (2) la alineación de semillas es escasa y la identificación de nuevas alineaciones generalmente es de una manera ruidosa y sin supervisión. Para abordar estos problemas, proponemos un novedoso método de alineación de gráficos adaptativa autosupervisada (SS-AGA). Específicamente, SS-AGA fusiona todos los KG como un gráfico completo al considerar la alineación como un nuevo tipo de borde. Como tal, la propagación de la información y la influencia del ruido en los KG se pueden controlar de forma adaptativa mediante pesos de atención conscientes de la relación. Mientras tanto, SS-AGA presenta un nuevo generador de pares que captura dinámicamente los pares de alineación potenciales en un paradigma autosupervisado. Amplios experimentos tanto en la DBpedia KG multilingüe pública como en la KG de comercio electrónico multilingüe industrial de nueva creación demuestran empíricamente la eficacia de SS-AGA', 'ja': '現代のKGは完全ではないため、ナレッジグラフ（ KG ）で欠落している事実を予測することが重要です。 人間の労働集約的なラベリングのため、様々な言語で表現される知識を扱うと、この現象は悪化する。 本稿では、限られたシードアライメントをブリッジとして活用し、複数の言語から集合的な知識を受け入れる多言語KGコンプリートを探求する。 しかしながら、以前の作品で使用された言語アライメントは依然として完全には利用されていない： （ 1 ）アライメントペアは、KGキャパシティの不一致を無視して、平行エンティティを最大限に閉じるように同等に扱われ、（ 2 ）シードアライメントは乏しく、新しいアライメント識別は通常、ノイズの多い監督されていない方法で行われる。 これらの課題に対処するために、新たな自己監督型適応グラフアライメント（ SS - AGA ）法を提案します。 具体的には、SS - AGAは、アライメントを新しいエッジタイプと見なすことで、すべてのKGをグラフ全体として融合させます。 したがって、ＫＧにわたる情報伝播及びノイズの影響は、関係を認識した注意重みを介して適応的に制御され得る。 一方、SS - AGAは、自己監視パラダイムでポテンシャルアライメントペアを動的に捕捉する新しいペアジェネレータを備えています。 公開多言語DBPedia KGと新たに作成された産業多言語EコマースKGの両方の広範な実験は、SS - AGAの有効性を実証しています', 'zh': '测知图谱(KG)阙失之事至重,以今KG远未成也。 劳动密集型之人表,以言语为恶。 本文中,讨论多言KG成,因有限之种对齐为桥梁,以受多种语言之集体知识。 然前事之言,齐犹不得尽用:(1)齐平等,推而近之,略KG容也。 (2)种对稀缺,新对准识常以嘈杂无监督。 为此一新,自适齐(SS-AGA)。 具体来说,SS-AGA 因齐为新缘,合诸 KG 为一体。 故知权重自适KG传噪声。 又SS-AGA 有新对发生器,可于自监范式中动获潜对。 凡公多言DBPedia KG与新功多言电子商务KG博实验验SS-AGA之有效性', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование недостающих фактов на графе знаний (КГ) имеет решающее значение, поскольку современные КГ далеки от завершения. Из-за трудоемкой маркировки человека это явление ухудшается при работе со знаниями, представленными на различных языках. В этой статье мы исследуем многоязычное завершение KG, которое использует ограниченное выравнивание семян в качестве моста, чтобы охватить коллективные знания с нескольких языков. Тем не менее, выравнивание языков, используемое в предыдущих работах, все еще не используется в полной мере: (1) пары выравнивания рассматриваются одинаково, чтобы максимально продвигать параллельные объекты, чтобы быть близкими, что игнорирует несоответствие емкости КГ; (2) выравнивание семян редко и новая идентификация выравнивания обычно осуществляется в шумной неконтролируемой манере. Чтобы решить эти проблемы, мы предлагаем новый метод адаптивного выравнивания графов (SS-AGA) с самоконтролем. В частности, SS-AGA объединяет все КГ в единый график, рассматривая выравнивание как новый тип кромки. Таким образом, распространение информации и влияние шума на КГ могут адаптивно контролироваться с помощью весов внимания, учитывающих отношение. Тем временем, SS-AGA имеет новый генератор пар, который динамически захватывает потенциальные пары выравнивания в парадигме с самоконтролем. Обширные эксперименты как на публичной многоязычной DBPedia KG, так и на недавно созданной промышленной многоязычной электронной коммерции KG эмпирически демонстрируют эффективность SS-AGA', 'hi': 'एक ज्ञान ग्राफ (केजी) में लापता तथ्यों की भविष्यवाणी करना महत्वपूर्ण है क्योंकि आधुनिक केजी पूरे होने से बहुत दूर हैं। श्रम-गहन मानव लेबलिंग के कारण, विभिन्न भाषाओं में प्रतिनिधित्व किए गए ज्ञान को संभालने पर यह घटना बिगड़ जाती है। इस पेपर में, हम बहुभाषी केजी पूरा होने का पता लगाते हैं, जो कई भाषाओं से सामूहिक ज्ञान को गले लगाने के लिए एक पुल के रूप में सीमित बीज संरेखण का लाभ उठाता है। हालांकि, पूर्व कार्यों में उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषा संरेखण अभी भी पूरी तरह से शोषण नहीं किया गया है: (1) संरेखण जोड़े को समान रूप से समानांतर संस्थाओं को बंद करने के लिए अधिकतम धक्का देने के लिए समान रूप से व्यवहार किया जाता है, जो केजी क्षमता असंगतता को अनदेखा करता है; (2) बीज संरेखण दुर्लभ है और नए संरेखण की पहचान आमतौर पर शोर रहित तरीके से होती है। इन मुद्दों से निपटने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास स्व-पर्यवेक्षित अनुकूली ग्राफ संरेखण (एसएस-एजीए) विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, एसएस-एजीए सभी केजी को एक नए किनारे प्रकार के रूप में संरेखण के बारे में एक पूरे ग्राफ के रूप में फ्यूज करता है। इस प्रकार, केजी में सूचना प्रसार और शोर प्रभाव को संबंध-जागरूक ध्यान वजन के माध्यम से अनुकूली रूप से नियंत्रित किया जा सकता है। इस बीच, एसएस-एजीए में एक नई जोड़ी जनरेटर है जो गतिशील रूप से एक स्व-पर्यवेक्षित प्रतिमान में संभावित संरेखण जोड़े को कैप्चर करती है। सार्वजनिक बहुभाषी DBPedia KG और नव-निर्मित औद्योगिक बहुभाषी ई-कॉमर्स KG दोनों पर व्यापक प्रयोग अनुभवजन्य रूप से एसएस-एजीए की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं', 'ga': 'Tá sé ríthábhachtach fíricí atá in easnamh a thuar i ngraf eolais (KG) toisc go bhfuil KGanna nua-aimseartha i bhfad ó bheith iomlán. Mar gheall ar lipéadú daonna atá dian ar shaothar, téann an feiniméan seo in olcas agus eolas á láimhseáil i dteangacha éagsúla. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar chríochnú ilteangach KG, a ghiaráil ailíniú síolta teoranta mar dhroichead, chun glacadh leis an eolas comhchoiteann ó iltheangacha. Mar sin féin, ní dhéantar leas iomlán a bhaint as ailíniú teanga a úsáideadh i saothair roimhe seo: (1) caitear go cothrom le péirí ailínithe chun aonáin chomhthreomhara a bhrú chun dlúth a mhéid is féidir, rud a thugann neamhaird ar neamhréireacht acmhainne KG; (2) tá ailíniú síolta gann agus is iondúil go mbíonn sainaithint ailínithe nua ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht. Chun dul i ngleic leis na saincheisteanna seo, molaimid modh nua um ailíniú graf oiriúnaitheach féinmhaoirsithe (SS-AGA). Go sonrach, comhlíonann SS-AGA gach KG mar ghraf iomlán trí ailíniú a dhéanamh mar chineál imeall nua. Mar sin, is féidir iomadú faisnéise agus tionchar torainn ar fud na KGanna a rialú go hoiriúnaitheach trí mheáchain aird ar an gcoibhneas. Idir an dá linn, gnéithe SS-AGA gineadóir péire nua a ghabháil dinimiciúil péirí ailínithe féideartha i paradigm féin-mhaoirseacht. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar an DB Pedia KG poiblí ilteangach agus Ríomhthráchtáil thionsclaíoch ilteangach nuachruthaithe KG go heimpíreach éifeachtacht SS-AGA', 'ka': 'ცნობიერი გრაფიკაში (KG) გამოკვებული ფაქტები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რადგან მოდინარე KGs უფრო დასრულებულია. სამუშაო-ინტენსტიგური ადამიანის ნიშანებისთვის ეს ფენომენი სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადას ამ გვერდიში, ჩვენ მრავალენგური KG დასრულებას განსხვავებთ, რომელიც განსხვავებს განსხვავებული შვილის დასრულებას, რომელიც მრავალენ ენებიდან კოლექტიური ცოდნიერებას მაგრამ, წინა სამუშაო სამუშაოში გამოყენებული ენების დასწორება უკვე არ გამოყენება: (1) დასწორებული ორივე განსხვავებული ორივე განსხვავებულია მაქსიმალურად დასწორებლად პარალელი ელექტიების (2) შვილის განზომილება არაა და ახალი განზომილების განზომილება უფრო დიდინტიფიკაცია არაფერად არაფერადებულია. ამ პრობლემების გარეშე, ჩვენ პრობლემებით ახალგაზრულებული ადაპტიგური გრაფიკური გარეშე (SS-AGA) მეტი. სპექტიკურად, SS- AGA ყველა KG- ს ყველა გრაფიკად გადაყენებს, როგორც განზომილება ახალი მხარეს ტიპის შესახებ. როგორც იგივეა, ინფორმაციის პროპაგიაცია და ბუნს შესაძლებელია KGs-ში ადაპტიგურად კონტროლირება შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია, როგორც შესაძ Meanwhile, SS-AGA features a new pair generator that dynamically captures potential alignment pairs in a self-supervised paradigm. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები სახელსაწინო მულტილური DBPedia KG და ახალი შექმნილი ინდოსტური მულტილური E-კომპორცია KG იმპერიკურად გამოჩვენება SS-AGA ეფექტიურობას', 'el': 'Η πρόβλεψη ελλείψεων γεγονότων σε ένα γράφημα γνώσης (KG) είναι κρίσιμη καθώς τα σύγχρονα ΚΓ δεν είναι καθόλου ολοκληρωμένα. Λόγω της υψηλής έντασης εργασίας ανθρώπινης σήμανσης, αυτό το φαινόμενο επιδεινώνεται όταν χειρίζεται τη γνώση που εκπροσωπείται σε διάφορες γλώσσες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε την πολύγλωσση ολοκλήρωση, η οποία αξιοποιεί την περιορισμένη ευθυγράμμιση σπόρων ως γέφυρα, για να αγκαλιάσει τη συλλογική γνώση από πολλές γλώσσες. Ωστόσο, η γλωσσική ευθυγράμμιση που χρησιμοποιήθηκε σε προηγούμενες εργασίες εξακολουθεί να μην αξιοποιείται πλήρως: (1) τα ζεύγη ευθυγράμμισης αντιμετωπίζονται εξίσου ώστε να ωθηθούν μέγιστα οι παράλληλες οντότητες να είναι κοντά, γεγονός που αγνοεί την ασυνέπεια της ικανότητας KG· (2) η ευθυγράμμιση σπόρων είναι σπάνια και η νέα ταυτοποίηση ευθυγράμμισης γίνεται συνήθως με θορυβώδη τρόπο χωρίς επίβλεψη. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο αυτοεποπτικής προσαρμογής γραφής (SS-AGA). Συγκεκριμένα, το SS-AGA συγχωνεύει όλα τα KG ως ολόκληρο γράφημα θεωρώντας την ευθυγράμμιση ως έναν νέο τύπο άκρων. Ως εκ τούτου, η διάδοση πληροφοριών και η επίδραση θορύβου σε ΚG μπορούν να ελεγχθούν προσαρμοστικά μέσω σταθμών προσοχής που λαμβάνουν υπόψη τις σχέσεις. Εν τω μεταξύ, διαθέτει μια νέα γεννήτρια ζευγαριών που συλλαμβάνει δυναμικά πιθανά ζεύγη ευθυγράμμισης σε ένα αυτοεποπτικό παράδειγμα. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα τόσο στο δημόσιο πολυγλωσσικό όσο και στο νεοσύστατο βιομηχανικό πολυγλωσσικό ηλεκτρονικό εμπόριο αποδεικνύουν εμπειρικά την αποτελεσματικότητα του SS-AGA', 'hu': 'A hiányzó tények előrejelzése egy tudásgrafban (KG) kulcsfontosságú, mivel a modern KG-k messze nem teljesek. A munkaigényes emberi címkézés miatt ez a jelenség romlik a különböző nyelveken képviselt ismeretek kezelése során. Ebben a tanulmányban a többnyelvű KG kiegészítést vizsgáljuk fel, amely a korlátozott magigazítást használja, mint egy híd, hogy magába foglalja a kollektív tudást több nyelven. A korábbi munkákban használt nyelvi igazítás azonban még mindig nem használható ki teljes mértékben: (1) az igazítási párokat egyenlően kezelik, hogy maximálisan a párhuzamos entitásokat közelítsék, ami figyelmen kívül hagyja a KG kapacitási következetlenségét; (2) A vetőmag beállítása ritka, és az új beállítások azonosítása általában zajosan felügyelet nélkül történik. E problémák megoldása érdekében egy új, önfelügyelt adaptív gráf igazítási (SS-AGA) módszert javasolunk. Konkrétan az SS-AGA az összes KG-t egy egész grafikonként egyesíti, úgy, hogy az igazítást új éltípusként tekinti. Ennek megfelelően az információterjedés és a zajhatás a KG-k között adaptívan szabályozható a kapcsolattudatos figyelemsúlyok segítségével. Eközben az SS-AGA egy új párgenerátorral rendelkezik, amely dinamikusan rögzíti a potenciális igazítási párokat egy önfelügyelt paradigmában. Az SS-AGA hatékonyságát a nyilvános többnyelvű DBPedia KG és az újonnan létrehozott ipari többnyelvű E-commerce KG területén egyaránt kiterjedt kísérletek mutatják empirikusan.', 'it': "Prevedere fatti mancanti in un grafico della conoscenza (KG) è fondamentale poiché i moderni KG sono tutt'altro che completi. A causa dell'etichettatura umana ad alta intensità di lavoro, questo fenomeno peggiora quando si tratta di conoscenze rappresentate in varie lingue. In questo articolo, esploriamo il completamento multilingue di KG, che sfrutta l'allineamento limitato dei semi come ponte, per abbracciare la conoscenza collettiva da più lingue. Tuttavia, l'allineamento linguistico utilizzato nelle opere precedenti non è ancora pienamente sfruttato: (1) le coppie di allineamento sono trattate allo stesso modo per spingere al massimo entità parallele ad essere vicine, il che ignora l'incoerenza di capacità KG; (2) l'allineamento delle sementi è scarso e l'identificazione dei nuovi allineamenti è solitamente in modo rumoroso e non sorvegliato. Per affrontare questi problemi, proponiamo un nuovo metodo di allineamento adattivo (SS-AGA) auto-supervisionato. Nello specifico, SS-AGA fonde tutti i KG come un grafico intero considerando l'allineamento come un nuovo tipo di bordo. Come tale, la propagazione delle informazioni e l'influenza del rumore attraverso i KG possono essere controllati adattivamente tramite pesi di attenzione consapevoli della relazione. Nel frattempo, SS-AGA dispone di un nuovo generatore di coppie che cattura dinamicamente le coppie di allineamento potenziali in un paradigma auto-supervisionato. Ampie sperimentazioni sia sul pubblico multilingue DBPedia KG che sul nuovo e-commerce industriale multilingue KG dimostrano empiricamente l'efficacia di SS-AGA", 'kk': 'Білім графикасында (KG) жоқ факттерді таңдау үшін қазіргі KG- дер толық емес. Адам жарлықтарын жұмыс істеу үшін мәліметтерді әртүрлі тілдерде қамтамасыз еткенде бұл пайда болады. Бұл қағазда біз көп тілді KG толтыруды зерттейміз. Бұл көпір тілдерінен бірнеше білімдерді біріктіру үшін шектелген таңбаларды көпір ретінде шектеп береді. Бірақ, алдыңғы жұмыстарда қолданылатын тіл туралауы әлі толық жұмыс істемейді: (1) туралау жиіліктері KG көмегімен байланыстырылмайтын параллель жиіліктерді жабу үшін шегіндіру үшін тең жақтығымен қа (2) Түздік туралауы жеткіліксіз және жаңа туралау идентификациясы кәдімгі дыбыс түрде қолданылмайды. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, біз романдық өзімізге бақылайтын адаптикалық графикалық түзету (SS-AGA) әдісін ұсынамыз. Ескерту үшін SS- AGA барлық KG- ді жаңа шетін түрі ретінде тегістеу үшін толық график ретінде біріктіреді. Мұндай секілде, KGs жүйесінде мәліметтің пропагациясы мен дыбыс әсерін қатынас арқылы қатынас арқылы бақылауға болады. Осы уақытта, SS- AGA өзінің қарау парадигмінде мүмкіндік түрлендіру жұмысын динамикалық түрлендіру үшін жаңа екі генератор болады. Көптілік DBPedia KG және жаңа құрылған индустриалдық көптілік E- тәртібі KG империялық SS- AGA эффективностін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Предвидувањето на недостасувачките факти во графикот за знаење (КГ) е клучно бидејќи модерните КГ се далеку од комплетни. Поради интензивното обележување на луѓето со работа, овој феномен се влошува кога се справува со знаењето претставено на различни јазици. Во овој весник, го истражуваме мултијазичното завршување на КГ, кое влијае на ограниченото наследување како мост, за да го прифатиме колективното знаење од повеќе јазици. Сепак, споредувањето на јазикот користено во претходните дела сé уште не е целосно искористено: (1) споредувачките парови се третирани еднакво за да се притисне максимално паралелните ентитети да бидат блиски, што ја игнорира несогласноста на капацитетот на КГ; (2) Поставувањето на семето е ретко и новата идентификација на поставувањето е обично на бучно ненадгледуван начин. За решавање на овие прашања, предложуваме нов метод за самонадгледувана адаптивна графика (СС-АГА). Специфично, SS-AGA ги спои сите KGs како цел граф со однос на насочувањето како нов тип на раб. Како такво, пропагацијата на информациите и влијанието на бучавата низ КГ може да се контролира адаптивно преку тегови на вниманието свесни за односот. Meanwhile, SS-AGA features a new pair generator that dynamically captures potential alignment pairs in a self-supervised paradigm.  Експериментите на јавната мултијазична ДБПедија КГ и на новоформираната индустриска мултијазична Е-трговија КГ емпирички ја демонстрираат ефикасноста на СС-АГА', 'lt': 'Būtina numatyti trūkstamus faktus žinių grafikoje (KG), nes šiuolaikinės KG nėra visiškos. Dėl darbo jėgai imlios žmogaus etiketės šis reiškinys pablogėja tvarkant įvairiomis kalbomis atstovaujamas žinias. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame daugiakalbį KG užbaigimą, kuris kaip tiltą sutelkia ribotą sėklos suderinimą, kad būtų įtrauktos kolektyvinės žinios iš įvairių kalbų. Tačiau ankstesniuose darbuose naudojamas kalbų suderinimas vis dar nėra visiškai išnaudojamas: (1) suderinimo poros traktuojamos taip pat, kad būtų kuo labiau priverstos arti lygiagrečių subjektų, o tai ignoruoja KG pajėgumų nenuoseklumą; (2) sėklos sureguliavimas yra retas, o naujas sureguliavimo identifikavimas paprastai triukšmingai nekontroliuojamas. Siekdami spręsti šiuos klausimus, siūlome naują savarankiškai prižiūrimą adaptacinio grafiko suderinimo metodą (SS-AGA). Konkrečiai SS-AGA jungia visus KG grafikus, atsižvelgiant į suderinimą kaip naują krašto tipą. Todėl informacijos sklaidą ir triukšmo poveikį KG galima pritaikomai kontroliuoti atsižvelgiant į santykinį dėmesį. Tuo tarpu SS-AGA įrengiamas naujas porų generatorius, kuris dinamiškai gauna potencialias suderinimo poros savarankiškai prižiūrint paradigm ą. Išsamūs eksperimentai su visuomenine daugiakalbe DBPedia KG ir naujai sukurta pramonės daugiakalbe e. prekyba KG empiriškai rodo SS-AGA veiksmingumą.', 'ms': 'Memandangkan fakta hilang dalam graf pengetahuan (KG) adalah penting kerana KG modern jauh dari selesai. Kerana label manusia yang berpengaruh dalam kerja, fenomena ini berkurang bila mengendalikan pengetahuan yang mewakili dalam berbagai bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi pelengkapan KG berbilang bahasa, yang menggunakan aliran benih terbatas sebagai jambatan, untuk memeluk pengetahuan kolektif dari berbagai bahasa. Namun, penyesuaian bahasa yang digunakan dalam kerja sebelumnya masih belum sepenuhnya dieksploitasi: (1) pasangan penyesuaian dianggap sama untuk maksimum mendorong entiti selari untuk dekat, yang mengabaikan ketidakkonsistensi kapasitas KG; (2) seed alignment is scarce and new alignment identification is usually in a noisily unsupervised manner.  Untuk menangani isu-isu ini, kami cadangkan cara penyesuaian graf adaptif (SS-AGA) yang mengawasi diri sendiri yang baru. Secara khusus, SS-AGA menghidupkan semua KG sebagai graf keseluruhan dengan mengenai penyesuaian sebagai jenis pinggir baru. Sebagai macam itu, penyebaran maklumat dan pengaruh bunyi di seluruh KG boleh dikawal secara adaptif melalui berat perhatian yang sedar hubungan. Sementara itu, SS-AGA mengandungi generator pasangan baru yang secara dinamik menangkap pasangan penyesuaian potensi dalam paradigm a yang mengawasi diri sendiri. Eksperimen luas pada kedua-dua DBPedia KG berbilang bahasa awam dan perniagaan E berbilang bahasa industri KG baru dicipta secara empirik menunjukkan kegunaan SS-AGA', 'mt': 'Il-previżjoni ta’ fatti nieqsa fil-grafika tal-għarfien (KG) hija kruċjali peress li l-KGs moderni mhumiex kompleti. Minħabba tikkettar tal-bniedem intensiv fix-xogħol, dan il-fenomenu jiddeterjora meta jimmaniġġja l-għarfien rappreżentat f’diversi lingwi. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nesploraw it-tlestija multilingwi tal-KG, li tagħti spinta lill-allinjament limitat taż-żerriegħa bħala pont, biex nipproduċu l-għarfien kollettiv minn diversi lingwi. Madankollu, l-allinjament tal-lingwi użat f’xogħlijiet preċedenti għadu mhux sfruttat bis-sħiħ: (1) il-pari tal-allinjament huma ttrattati bl-istess mod biex jimbuttaw l-aktar entitajiet paralleli biex ikunu qrib, li jinjora l-inkonsistenza tal-kapaċità tal-KG; (2) l-allinjament taż-żerriegħa huwa skars u l-identifikazzjoni l-ġdida tal-allinjament normalment tkun b’mod storbjuż mhux sorveljat. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ta’ allinjament tal-grafika adattiva (SS-AGA) li jkun sorveljat minnu nnifsu. B’mod speċifiku, SS-AGA jgħaqqad il-KGs kollha bħala grafika sħiħa billi tirrigwarda l-allinjament bħala tip ġdid ta’ tarf. Bħala tali, il-propagazzjoni tal-informazzjoni u l-influwenza tal-istorbju fil-KGs jistgħu jiġu kkontrollati b’mod adattiv permezz ta’ piżijiet ta’ attenzjoni li jkunu konxji mir-relazzjoni. Sadanittant, SS-AGA għandha ġeneratur ġdid ta’ par li b’mod dinamiku jaqbad pari ta’ allinjament potenzjali f’paradigm a awtosorveljata. Esperimenti estensivi kemm fuq DBPedia KG multilingwi pubbliċi kif ukoll fuq il-kummerċ elettroniku multilingwi industrijali li għadu kif inħoloq KG juru empirikament l-effikaċja ta’ SS-AGA', 'ml': 'അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫില്\u200d കാണാത്ത വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d മുന്\u200dഗണന ചെയ്യുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. ആധുനിക ക കെജികള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലുള്ള വിജ്ഞാനം കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d ഈ സ്വഭാവം കുഴപ്പമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പല ഭാഷ കെജി പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വിത്തുകള്\u200d ഒരു പാലിയായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ന എന്നാലും മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലികളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ സജ്ജീകരണം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നില്ല: (1) അടയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d അടയ്ക്കുന്ന അടയാള (2) seed alignment is scarce and new alignment identification is usually in a noisily unsupervised manner.  ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ എതിര്\u200dത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d, നോവല്\u200d സ്വയം സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആത്മാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഗ്രാപ്റ്റിമെന്\u200dറ് മാറ്റ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, എസ്സ്-AGA പുതിയ മുഴുവൻ ഗ്രാഫ് ആയി എല്ലാ കെജികളെയും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതുപോലെ എസ്സ്-AGA ഒരു പുതിയ ജോട്ട് ജനററെറ്റര്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാര്\u200dഡിഡിമില്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള സ പൊതു പല ഭാഷ ഡിബിപിഡിയ കെജിയിലും പുതുതായി സൃഷ്ടിച്ചുണ്ടാക്കിയ വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന കെജിയുടെ പ്രവർത്തികമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളിലും പ്രധാ', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн график (KG) дээрх алдагдсан үнэнийг тодорхойлох нь орчин үеийн KG нь бүтэлгүйтлээс хол чухал. Хүмүүсийн хүн төрөлхтний тэмдэглэгүүдийн үр дүнд энэ явдал олон хэл дээр мэдлэгийг удирдах үед муу болдог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон хэлний KG төгсгөлийг судалж байна. Энэ нь үр зэрэг хязгаарлагдсан тусламжтай, олон хэлний нийгмийн мэдлэгийг хүлээж авдаг. Гэхдээ өмнө ажиллах үед хэрэглэгдсэн хэлний товчлол бүрэн ашиглахгүй: (1) товчлолтын хоёр нь KG-ийн чадварыг тэгш байдлыг ойртохын тулд хамгийн зэрэг товчлолтын товчлолтын тулд эмчилдэг байдаг. (2) Бүхдийн товчлолт хэцүү, шинэ товчлолтын тодорхойлолт ихэвчлэн чимээгүй аргаар байдаг. Эдгээр асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид өөрсдийгөө удирдлагатай адаптийн график түгжүүлэх (SS-AGA) аргыг санал болгоно. Ялангуяа SS-AGA нь бүх KG-г шинэ хэлбэрийн тухай шинэ хэлбэрээр график болгон цуглуулдаг. Ийм мэт, мэдээллийн дэвшүүлэлт болон чимээ нөлөөлөх нь КГ-д харилцааны анхаарал татах хэмжээний аргаар адаптацхан удирдаж болно. Гэвч SS-AGA өөрийгөө удирдлагатай парадигм дээр шинэ хоёр генератор нь динамик хэлбэрээр хөгжүүлэх боломжтой хоёрыг барьдаг. Нийтийн олон хэлний DBPedia KG болон шинээр бүтээсэн үйлдвэрлэлийн олон хэлний E-худалдааны KG-ын үр дүнг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Førehandsvising av manglende faktar i eit kunnskapsgraf (KG) er viktig fordi moderne KG er langt frå fullført. På grunn av arbeid-intensivt menneskelapp blir denne fenomenen forstørra når denne hendinga handterer kunnskap representert i ulike språk. I denne papiret utforskar vi fleirspråksfullføring av KG, som leverer begrensede frøjusteringa som ein bru, for å beskrive den samlinga kunnskapen frå fleire språk. Men språk-justeringa som vert brukt i førre arbeid er fortsatt ikkje fullstendig brukt: (1) justeringspar vert behandla like for å trykke parallelle einingar til å lukka, som ignorerer KG-kapasiteten for ikkje-konsistens. (2) frøjusteringa er kryssa og nytt justeringsidentifikasjon er vanlegvis på ein støyleg uverkjend måte. For å løse disse problemene, foreslår vi eit nytt automatisk tilpassande grafikkjustering (SS-AGA). Spesifisert, SS- AGA får alle KG som heilt graf ved hjelp av justeringa som eit nytt kanttype. Som slik kan informasjonspropagasjon og støyinfluksjon gjennom KGs vera tilpassa kontrollt ved hjelp av merksomhetsverke i relasjonsvare. Med mellomtida er SS- AGA eigentleg ein ny par-generator som dynamisk hentar potensielle justeringspar i ein sjølvovervakt paradigm. Ekstra eksperimenter på både offentlige multispråk DBPedia KG og nytt oppretta industriell multispråk e-komerce KG empirisk viser effektiviteten av SS-AGA', 'sr': 'Predviđanje nestalih činjenica u grafiku znanja (KG) je ključno jer su moderne KG daleko od kompletne. Zbog radnog intenzivnog ljudskog etiketiranja, ovaj fenomen se pogoršava kada se bavi znanjem predstavljenim na različitim jezicima. U ovom papiru istražujemo višejezičku kompletnost KG, koja utiče na ograničenje poravnanja semena kao most, da prihvatimo kolektivno znanje iz višestrukih jezika. Međutim, poravnanje jezika koji se koristi u prethodnim radovima još uvek nije u potpunosti iskorištavano: (1) pare poravnanja se jednako tretiraju kako bi se maksimalno pritiskali paralelne entitate da budu blizu, što ignoriše neskladnost kapaciteta KG-a; (2) poravnanje semena je manje, a nova identifikacija poravnanja je obično na bukvalno neodređen način. Da bi se riješili ovih problema, predlažemo novu metodu adaptivnog prilagodbe grafika (SS-AGA). Posebno, SS-AGA spaja sve KGs kao celi grafik zbog poravnanja kao novi tip ivice. Kao takav, informativna propagacija i uticaj buke na preko KGs može biti adaptivno kontrolirana putem težine pažnje svjesne veze. U međuvremenu, SS-AGA prikazuje novi generator par koji dinamički uhvati potencijalne pare poravnanja u samopouzdanoj paradigmi. Eksperimenti o javnoj multijezičkoj DBPediji KG i novo stvorenoj industrijskoj multijezičkoj e-trgovini KG empirički pokazuju učinkovitost SS-AGA', 'ro': 'Prezicerea faptelor lipsă într-un grafic de cunoaștere (KG) este crucială deoarece KG-urile moderne sunt departe de a fi complete. Datorită etichetării umane intensive, acest fenomen se deteriorează atunci când manipulăm cunoștințele reprezentate în diferite limbi. În această lucrare, explorăm completarea multilingvă a KG, care utilizează alinierea limitată a semințelor ca punte, pentru a îmbrățișa cunoștințele colective din mai multe limbi. Cu toate acestea, alinierea limbii utilizate în lucrările anterioare nu este încă exploatată pe deplin: (1) perechile de aliniere sunt tratate în mod egal pentru a împinge maxim entitățile paralele să fie aproape, ceea ce ignoră inconsecvența capacității KG; (2) alinierea semințelor este rară și identificarea noilor alinieri este, de obicei, într-un mod zgomotos nesupravegheat. Pentru a aborda aceste probleme, propunem o nouă metodă de aliniere adaptivă auto-supravegheată a graficului (SS-AGA). Mai exact, SS-AGA fuzionează toate KG-urile ca un grafic întreg privind alinierea ca un nou tip de margine. Ca atare, propagarea informațiilor și influența zgomotului la nivelul KG-urilor pot fi controlate adaptiv prin intermediul greutăților atenției conștiente de relație. Între timp, SS-AGA dispune de un nou generator de perechi care captează dinamic perechile potențiale de aliniere într-o paradigmă auto-supravegheată. Experimentele extinse atât pe DBPedia KG multilingvă publică, cât și pe noua creație industrială multilingvă E-commerce KG demonstrează empiric eficacitatea SS-AGA', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie brakujących faktów w wykresie wiedzy (KG) ma kluczowe znaczenie, ponieważ współczesne KG nie są kompletne. Ze względu na pracochłonne oznakowanie ludzi zjawisko to pogarsza się podczas obsługi wiedzy reprezentowanej w różnych językach. W niniejszym artykule badamy wielojęzyczne uzupełnianie KG, które wykorzystuje ograniczone osiągnięcie nasion jako most, aby obejmować zbiorową wiedzę z wielu języków. Jednakże wyrównanie językowe stosowane w poprzednich pracach nadal nie jest w pełni wykorzystywane: (1) para wyrównania są traktowane równie, aby maksymalnie popchnąć równoległe jednostki do bliskości, co pomija niespójność pojemności KG; (2) wyrównanie materiałów siewnych jest rzadkie, a identyfikacja nowego wyrównania jest zwykle w sposób hałaśliwy bez nadzoru. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy nową metodę samodzielnego wyrównania adaptacyjnego wykresu (SS-AGA). W szczególności SS-AGA łączy wszystkie KG jako cały wykres, traktując wyrównanie jako nowy typ krawędzi. W związku z tym rozprzestrzenianie się informacji i wpływ hałasu w KG można adaptacyjnie kontrolować za pomocą wag uwagi świadomej relacji. Tymczasem SS-AGA posiada nowy generator par, który dynamicznie rejestruje potencjalne pary wyrównania w paradygmacie samodzielnie nadzorowanym. Obszerne eksperymenty zarówno na publicznej wielojęzycznej DBPedia KG, jak i nowo utworzonej przemysłowej wielojęzycznej E-commerce KG empirycznie pokazują skuteczność SS-AGA', 'so': 'Qoraalka aqoonta (KG) waa muhiim, sababtoo ah KGs waa ka fog yihiin dhamaan. Shahaadada dadka aad u shaqeynayso darteed waxyaabahaas way sii korodhsadaa marka la shaqeeyo aqoonta ay ku qoran yihiin luuqado kala duduwan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku baaraannaa dhamaanka KG oo luuqadaha kala duduwan, kaas oo ku qoran korriinka farshaxanka oo kooban sida daraf, si aan aqoonta kulul uga koobanno luuqado kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee isbedelka luuqada ee shaqada hore looma isticmaali karo dhammaan: (1) Lambarka isbedelka waxaa loola macaamiloodaa si isku mid ah si uu ugu dhaqaaqo alaabta lambarka ah si uu u dhowaado, kaas oo ka jeedo awoodda qiimo la’aanta KG; (2) Isbedelinta abuurku waa yar tahay, aqoonsiga cusub waa sida caadiga ah oo aan la ilaalin. Si aan u tacliino arrimahan, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa qaab sawir oo isbedelka sawirida (SS-AGA). Si gaar ah, SS-AGA wuxuu u fududeeyaa dhammaan KGs oo dhan sida tallaabo oo kale oo ku saabsan isbedelinta sida nooc cusub. Tusaale ahaan ogeysiinta iyo saameyn ku yeelashada codka ee KGs oo dhan waxaa lagu maamuli karaa si adag looga maamulo miisaanka taxadirka. Inta waqtigaas, SS-AGA wuxuu qabanqaabiyaa labo cusub oo dhashay oo ku qabsada labada isbedelka oo suurtagal ah si ay u eg tahay. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan dhaqanka kala duduwan DBPedia KG iyo dhaqdhaqaale-created ganacsi kala duduwan KG ayaa si fiican u muujiya saamaynta SS-AGA', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு வரைப்படத்தில் காணவில்லை Due to labor-intensive human labeling, this phenomenon deteriorates when handling knowledge represented in various languages.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல மொழி கேஜி முடிவை தேடுகிறோம், அது ஒரு பால் விதிகள் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட விதியை ஒழுங்குப்படுத்தல், பல மொழிகளி @ info (2) விளிம்பு ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் குறைவானது மற்றும் புதிய ஒழுங்கு அடையாளம் வழக்கமாக ஒலிக்கப்படாத வகையில் உள்ளது. இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய பாதையை தானே கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட ஒழுங்கு வரைபடம் (SS- AGA) முறைமை குறிப்பிட்டு, SS- AGA புதிய விளிம்பு வகையாக ஒழுங்குபடுத்தும் பொருட்டு அனைத்து KGகளையும் ஒரு முழு வரைபடமாக து உதாரணமாக, KGs முழுவதும் தகவல் வெளிப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் ஒலி பாக்கியம் தொடர்பு உணர்ந்து கொள்ளும் எடைகளின் மூலம் தொடர்பு  இப்போது, SS- AGA ஒரு புதிய ஜோடி உருவாக்கியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அது தானாகவே சாத்தியமான ஒழுங்கு ஜோடி தன்னை பராமரிக்கப்பட்ட அளபுரு பொது பல மொழி டிபிடியா கேஜி மற்றும் புதிய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பமான E- வணிக வியாபாரத்தின் விருப்பத்தேர்வுகள் KG எஸ்- AGA விளைவுகளை வெ', 'si': 'දැනගන්න ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකේ අතුරුදන්න ඇත්ත (KG) කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අධාරික KGs සම්පූර්ණයෙන්  මිනිස්සු ලේබිල් එක්ක වැඩ කරන්න හිතුවේ මේ සිද්ධ විසින් විවිධ භාෂාවක් වලින් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් දැන මේ පැත්තට, අපි ගොඩක් භාෂාවික KG සම්පූර්ණය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් සීමාවිත සීමාව සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා පැත්තක් වගේ නමුත්, කලින් වැඩේ භාෂාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නෑ: (1) සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන (2) සීඩ් සම්පූර්ණය අවශ්\u200dයයි, අළුත් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සම්පූර්ණයෙන් අවශ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න, අපි නියම ස්වයංග්\u200dරහයක් පරීක්ෂා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (SS-AGA) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. විශේෂයෙන්, SS- AGA හැම KGs මුළු ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා අළ අනිවාර්යෙන්, තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ශබ්දය ප්\u200dරශ්නය KGs වල සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් සම්බන්ධ අවධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ අතර වෙලාවේ, SS-AGA අළුත් ජෝනේටර් එකක් අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන සාමාජික භාෂාව DBPedia KG සහ අළුත් නිර්මාණ ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්තික ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්තා වල භාෂාව E- ව්\u200dයාපාරිත්තා KG සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාප', 'sv': 'Att förutse saknade fakta i en kunskapsgraf (KG) är avgörande eftersom moderna KG är långt ifrån kompletta. På grund av arbetsintensiv mänsklig märkning försämras detta fenomen vid hantering av kunskaper representerade på olika språk. I denna uppsats utforskar vi flerspråkig KG komplettering, som utnyttjar begränsad fröjustering som en bro, för att omfamna den kollektiva kunskapen från flera språk. Den språkanpassning som använts i tidigare arbeten utnyttjas dock fortfarande inte fullt ut: (1) anpassningspar behandlas lika för att maximalt få parallella enheter att vara nära, vilket bortser från KG kapacitets inkonsekvens. (2) Utsädesanpassningen är bristfällig och identifieringen av ny anpassning sker vanligtvis på ett bullrigt och obevakat sätt. För att ta itu med dessa frågor föreslår vi en ny självövervakad adaptiv grafjusteringsmetod (SS-AGA). Specifikt smälter SS-AGA alla KG som en hel graf genom att betrakta justering som en ny kanttyp. Som sådan kan informationsspridning och bruspåverkan över KG anpassas med hjälp av relationsberoende uppmärksamhetsvikter. Samtidigt har SS-AGA en ny pargenerator som dynamiskt fångar potentiella anpassningspar i ett självövervakat paradigm. Omfattande experiment på både den offentliga flerspråkiga DBPedia KG och nyskapad industriell flerspråkig E-handel KG visar empiriskt effektiviteten av SS-AGA', 'ur': 'ایک علم گراف (KG) میں گم ہونے والی حقیقت کی پیش کرنا ضروری ہے کیونکہ مدرنی KGs کامل سے دور ہیں۔ مزاحمت کے مطابق انسان کی لابلینگ کی وجہ سے، جب علم کی حفاظت کرنا مختلف زبانوں میں دکھائی جاتی ہے، یہ اتفاق افسوس ہوتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم بہت سی زبان کی کجی کامل کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، جو ایک پل کے طور پر محدود میدان کی تعمیر کرتی ہے، اور بہت سی زبانوں سے جمع علم کو پکڑتے ہیں۔ However, language alignment used in prior works is still not fully exploited: (1) alignment pairs are treated as equally to maximally push parallel entities to be close, which ignores KG capacity inconsistency; (2) انڈیل تغییرات کم ہے اور نئی تغییرات کی شناسایی معمولاً آواز سے غیر قائم ہوتی ہے۔ یہ مسئلہ حل کرنے کے لئے ہم نے ایک نئی اپنا نظارت رکھا ہوا اڈپٹیٹ گراف متصل (SS-AGA) طریقہ پیش کیا ہے۔ خاص طور پر، SS- AGA تمام KGs کو ایک پورا گراف کے طور پر ایک نئی کنڈ ٹائپ کے طور پر تنظیم کرتا ہے. اس طرح، اطلاعات پھیلانے اور صدا کے اثر KGs میں اچھی طرح کنٹرول کر سکتے ہیں۔ یہاں تک کہ SS-AGA ایک نئی جوڑی جنراٹر کو شامل کرتا ہے جسے سینامیک طور پر پھنسی سینالیٹ جوڑوں کو ایک اپنی نظارت کی پارادیگ میں پکڑتا ہے. دوسری ملتی زبان کے DBPedia KG اور نئی مصنعتی ملتی زبان کے E-commerce KG کی عمدگی دکھاتی ہے', 'uz': "Ta\xa0ľrif grafikda ma\xa0ľlumot yo\xa0Ľq ma\xa0ľlumotni tayyorlash juda muhim, chunki modern KGs to\xa0Ľxtatilmagan. Bu narsalar har xil tillarda ta'minlovchi narsalarni qo'llashda, bu narsa ko'p tillarda ta'lim qo'llaniladi. Bu hujjatda biz bir necha tillar KG tuzuvni ko'rib chiqimiz. Bu ko'plab tillardan bir xil tildan bir necha xil tillardan bir xil ilmo'zgarishni qo'yish uchun qo'l tartib keladi. @ info: whatsthis @ info To tackle these issues, we propose a novel self-supervised adaptive graph alignment (SS-AGA) method.  @ info Shunday qilib, KGs orqali ma\xa0ľlumot propagatsiya va tovush effekti ta\xa0ľminlovchi ta\xa0ľminlovchi ta\xa0ľminlovchi paytlari orqali boshqarish mumkin. Va paytda, SS- AGA yangi ikki generatorni animatik qo'llab tashlaydi. Avto- qo\xa0Ľllanilgan parametrga qo\xa0Ľyish mumkin. Ko'pchilik tilida bir necha tillar DBPedia KG va yangi ishlab chiqaradigan industrial E- tizim tizimi KG'ning tashkilotlarini ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Dự đoán các dữ kiện thiếu sót trong đồ thị kiến thức (KG) rất quan trọng vì KG hiện đại còn chưa hoàn thành. Do cách tốt nghiệp các con người cảm nhận, hiện nay sẽ tồn tại khi biết được biểu diễn ra ở thứ mấy ngôn ngữ khác. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ khám phá việc hoàn thành KG đa dạng, nhờ đó việc nâng tầm cấu hình hạt giống như một cây cầu, để bao gồm kiến thức tập thể từ nhiều ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, việc sắp xếp ngôn ngữ trong các tác phẩm trước vẫn chưa được khai thác đầy đủ: 1) các cặp phối hợp được đối xử ngang nhau để ép các thực thể song song song song phải đóng cửa tối đa, mà bỏ qua mâu thuẫn về khả năng KG. (2) việc sắp xếp hạt giống rất hiếm và việc xác định vị trí mới thường là theo một cách ồn ào không giám sát. Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp chỉnh đồ thị theo dõi mới (S-AGA). Cụ thể, S-AGA kết hợp tất cả các Km trong tích đồ thị bằng cách xem các đường thẳng như một kiểu cạnh mới. Thông tin truyền thông và sức ảnh hưởng của tiếng ồn trên mỗi siêu xe tăng có thể được kiểm soát thích nghi nhờ lượng chú ý quan tâm. Trong khi đó, S-AGRA có một máy phát hai mới có thể nắm bắt từng cặp tương thể thẳng hàng trong một mô hình tự giám sát. Việc thử nghiệm rộng rãi cả trên con người...dịchcon KG- G và tái tạo ra thương lượng điện-thương nghiệp nhiều loại đều đặn của Công ty SG hiển thị hiệu quả của SS-AGA', 'bg': 'Предсказването на липсващи факти в графика на знанието (КГ) е от решаващо значение, тъй като съвременните КГ далеч не са завършени. Поради трудоемкото човешко етикетиране, това явление се влошава при работа със знанията, представени на различни езици. В тази статия изследваме многоезичното завършване на КГ, което използва ограниченото подравняване на семената като мост, за да приеме колективното познание от множество езици. Въпреки това езиковото подравняване, използвано в предишни произведения, все още не е напълно експлоатирано: (1) двойките подравняване се третират еднакво, за да бъдат максимално близки паралелни единици, което пренебрегва несъответствието на капацитета на КГ; (2) подравняването на семената е оскъдно и идентифицирането на ново подравняване обикновено е шумно без надзор. За да се справим с тези проблеми, предлагаме нов метод за адаптивно подравняване на графиките (СС-АГА). По-конкретно SS-AGA слива всички КГ като цяла графика, като разглежда подравняването като нов тип ръб. По този начин разпространението на информацията и влиянието на шума в КГ могат да бъдат адаптивно контролирани чрез съотношението на вниманието тежести. Междувременно разполага с нов генератор за двойки, който динамично улавя потенциални двойки за подравняване в парадигма, която се контролира самостоятелно. Обширни експерименти както върху публичната многоезична DBPedia KG, така и върху новосъздадената индустриална многоезична електронна търговия KG емпирично демонстрират ефективността на SS-AGA', 'nl': "Het voorspellen van ontbrekende feiten in een kennisgrafiek (KG) is cruciaal omdat moderne KG's verre van compleet zijn. Door arbeidsintensieve menselijke etikettering verslechtert dit fenomeen bij het hanteren van kennis in verschillende talen. In dit artikel onderzoeken we meertalige KG voltooiing, die gebruik maakt van beperkte zaaduitlijning als brug, om de collectieve kennis uit meerdere talen te omarmen. De taaluitlijning die in eerdere werken werd gebruikt, wordt echter nog steeds niet volledig benut: (1) uitlijningsparen worden gelijk behandeld om parallelle entiteiten maximaal te pushen om dicht bij elkaar te zijn, waardoor inconsistentie in de capaciteit van KG wordt genegeerd; (2) de uitlijning van zaad is schaars en de identificatie van nieuwe uitlijning gebeurt meestal op een lawaaierige manier zonder toezicht. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuwe self-supervised adaptive graph alignment (SS-AGA) methode voor. Specifiek, SS-AGA fuseert alle KG's als een hele grafiek door uitlijning te beschouwen als een nieuw randtype. Zo kunnen informatieverspreiding en geluidsinvloed over KG's adaptief worden geregeld via relatiebewuste aandachtsgewichten. Ondertussen beschikt SS-AGA over een nieuwe koppelgenerator die potentiële uitlijningsparen dynamisch vastlegt in een zelfbegeleid paradigma. Uitgebreide experimenten met zowel de publieke meertalige DBPedia KG als de nieuw opgerichte industriële meertalige E-commerce KG tonen empirisch de effectiviteit van SS-AGA aan", 'da': "Forudsigelse af manglende fakta i en vidensgraf (KG) er afgørende, da moderne KG'er langt fra er komplette. På grund af arbejdskraftintensive menneskelige mærkninger forværres dette fænomen, når man håndterer viden repræsenteret på forskellige sprog. I denne artikel undersøger vi flersproget KG komplettering, som udnytter begrænset frøjustering som en bro, til at omfavne den kollektive viden fra flere sprog. Den sproglige justering, der anvendes i tidligere værker, udnyttes imidlertid stadig ikke fuldt ud: (1) justeringspar behandles ligeligt for maksimalt at skubbe parallelle enheder til at være tæt på, hvilket ignorerer KG-kapacitetens inkonsekvens; (2) Tilpasningen af frø er knap, og identifikationen af ny tilpasning foregår normalt på en støjende måde uden tilsyn. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi en ny selvovervåget adaptiv grafjusteringsmetode (SS-AGA). Specielt, SS-AGA smelter alle KG'er som en hel graf ved at betragte justering som en ny kanttype. Som sådan kan informationsspredning og støjpåvirkning på tværs af KG'er tilpasses via relationsbevidste opmærksomhedsvægte. I mellemtiden har SS-AGA en ny pargenerator, der dynamisk fanger potentielle justeringspar i et selvovervåget paradigme. Omfattende eksperimenter på både den offentlige flersprogede DBPedia KG og nyoprettede industrielle flersprogede E-handel KG viser empirisk effektiviteten af SS-AGA", 'hr': 'Predviđanje nestalih činjenica u grafiku znanja (KG) je ključno jer su moderne KG daleko od kompletne. Zbog intenzivne ljudske etikete rada taj fenomen se pogoršava kada se bavi znanjem predstavljenim na različitim jezicima. U ovom papiru istražujemo višejezičku završetku KG-a, koja utiče na ograničeno poravnanje sjemena kao most, prihvatiti kolektivno znanje iz višestrukih jezika. Međutim, poravnanje jezika koji se koristi u prethodnim radovima još uvijek ne koristi u potpunosti: (1) pare poravnanja se jednako tretiraju kako bi se maksimalno pritiskali paralelne entitate da budu blizu, što ignorira neskladnost kapaciteta KG-a; (2) poravnanje sjemena je manje, a nova identifikacija poravnanja obično je na bukvalno neodređen način. Za rješavanje tih pitanja predlažemo novu metodu prilagođavanja grafika (SS-AGA). Posebno, SS-AGA spaja sve KGs kao cijeli grafik zbog poravnanja kao novi tip ruba. Kao takvo, utjecaj na proširenje informacija i buku u širom KGs može se prilagoditi putem težine pažnje svjesne na odnose. U međuvremenu, SS-AGA prikazuje novi generator par koji dinamički uhvati potencijalne pare poravnanja u samopouzdanoj paradigmi. Prošireni eksperimenti o javnoj multijezičkoj DBPediji KG i novo stvorenoj industrijskoj multijezičkoj e-trgovini KG empirički pokazuju učinkovitost SS-AGA-a', 'de': 'Die Vorhersage fehlender Fakten in einem Wissensgraphen (KG) ist entscheidend, da moderne KGs noch lange nicht vollständig sind. Aufgrund arbeitsintensiver menschlicher Kennzeichnung verschlechtert sich dieses Phänomen beim Umgang mit Wissen in verschiedenen Sprachen. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir mehrsprachige KG-Fertigstellung, die begrenzte Seed Alignment als Brücke nutzt, um das kollektive Wissen aus mehreren Sprachen zu umfassen. Die Sprachausrichtung, die in früheren Arbeiten verwendet wurde, wird jedoch immer noch nicht vollständig ausgenutzt: (1) Ausrichtungspaare werden gleich behandelt, um parallele Entitäten maximal nahe zu bringen, was die Inkonsistenz der KG-Kapazität ignoriert; (2) Die Saatgutausrichtung ist selten und die Neuausrichtung erfolgt in der Regel geräuschlos unbeaufsichtigt. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, schlagen wir eine neuartige selbstüberwachte adaptive Graph Alignment (SS-AGA) Methode vor. Insbesondere fusioniert SS-AGA alle KGs als ganzer Graph, indem die Ausrichtung als neuen Kantentyp betrachtet wird. Infolgedessen können Informationsausbreitung und Geräuscheinflüsse über KGs adaptiv über relationsbewusste Aufmerksamkeitsgewichte gesteuert werden. Unterdessen verfügt SS-AGA über einen neuen Paargenerator, der potenzielle Ausrichtungspaare dynamisch in einem selbstüberwachten Paradigma erfasst. Umfangreiche Experimente sowohl an der öffentlichen mehrsprachigen DBPedia KG als auch an der neu geschaffenen industriellen mehrsprachigen E-Commerce KG belegen empirisch die Wirksamkeit von SS-AGA', 'id': 'Memprediksi fakta hilang dalam grafik pengetahuan (KG) adalah penting karena KG modern jauh dari selesai. Karena tanda-tanda manusia yang memaksa pekerjaan, fenomena ini semakin buruk ketika menangani pengetahuan yang diwakili dalam berbagai bahasa. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi pelengkapan KG berbagai bahasa, yang menggunakan aliran benih terbatas sebagai jembatan, untuk menerima pengetahuan kolektif dari berbagai bahasa. However, language alignment used in prior works is still not fully exploited: (1) alignment pairs are treated equally to maximally push parallel entities to be close, which ignores KG capacity inconsistency;  (2) penyesuaian benih jarang dan identifikasi penyesuaian baru biasanya dalam cara yang tidak diawasi dengan suara. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami mengusulkan metode penyesuaian grafik adaptif (SS-AGA) yang baru yang diawasi oleh diri sendiri. Secara spesifik, SS-AGA menyatukan semua KG sebagai grafik keseluruhan dengan mengenai penyesuaian sebagai tipe pinggir baru. Sebagai seperti itu, propagasi informasi dan pengaruh bunyi di seluruh KG dapat dikendalikan secara adaptif melalui berat perhatian yang menyadari hubungan. Sementara itu, SS-AGA memiliki generator pasangan baru yang secara dinamik menangkap pasangan penyesuaian potensial dalam paradigm a yang diawasi oleh diri sendiri. Extensive experiments on both the public multilingual DBPedia KG and newly-created industrial multilingual E-commerce KG empirically demonstrate the effectiveness of SS-AGA', 'ko': '예측지식도(KG)에서 부족한 사실은 현대 KG가 아직 완성하지 못했기 때문에 매우 중요하다.노동집약적인 인간 표기 때문에 각종 언어로 표시된 지식을 처리할 때 이런 현상은 악화된다.본고에서 우리는 다중 언어인 KG보완을 연구했는데 유한한 씨앗을 교량으로 삼아 다양한 언어에서 나온 집단 지식을 받아들였다.그러나 이전의 업무에서 사용된 언어의 정렬은 여전히 충분히 이용되지 못했다. (1) 정렬은 평등하게 대우되고 병행 실체의 접근을 최대한 추진하기 때문에 불일치성을 소홀히 했다.(2) 종자 비교는 희소하고 새로운 비교 식별은 통상적으로 감독이 없는 방식으로 진행된다.이러한 문제들을 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 자체 감독 자체 적응도 정렬(SS-AGA) 방법을 제시했다.구체적으로 SS-AGA는 정렬을 새로운 모서리 유형으로 간주함으로써 모든 KG를 하나의 전체 그림으로 융합시킨다.따라서 KG 전반의 정보 전파와 소음 영향은 관계 감지 주의 권중을 통해 스스로 조절할 수 있다.또한 SS-AGA는 자체 감독의 예에서 잠재적인 짝을 동적으로 포착할 수 있는 새로운 짝짓기 생성기를 가지고 있다.공공 다국어 DBPedia KG와 새로 창설된 산업 다국어 전자상거래 KG에서 진행된 대량의 실험은 SS-AGA의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'sw': 'KG ni muhimu kwa kuwa KGs za kisasa hazina umuhimu. Kutokana na utambulisho mkubwa wa binadamu wa kazi, hali hii inazidi kuongezeka pale kukabiliana na maarifa yaliyowakilishwa katika lugha mbalimbali. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza mwisho wa KG wa lugha nyingi, ambazo vizazi vingi vimezungumzwa kwa uzazi kama daraja, ili kuingilia maarifa ya pamoja kutoka lugha mbalimbali. Hata hivyo, uzalishaji wa lugha uliotumiwa katika kazi za kabla bado hautumika kabisa: (1) wanandoa wa kujitengeneza wanachukuliwa sawa na hivyo ili kuzuia vifaa vinavyofanana kuwa karibu zaidi, ambavyo vinavyopuuza uwezo wa KG usio na ukosefu wa kukosekana; (2) Uuzalishaji wa uzazi ni nadra na utambulisho mpya wa usambazaji mara nyingi huwa kwa namna isiyo na maana. Ili kukabiliana na masuala haya, tunapendekeza njia ya simu yenyewe inavyofuatiliwa kwa kujitazama (SS-AGA). Kwa hakika, SS-AGA inafutilia KGs zote kama picha nzima na kuhusiana na usafirishaji kama aina mpya ya upande. As such, information propagation and noise influence across KGs can be adaptively controlled via relation-aware attention weights.  Wakati huo huo, SS-AGA inaonyesha muuzaji mpya wa viwili vinavyojitenga na kutengeneza viwili vinavyowezekana katika upinzani wa kujichunguza. Majaribio mengi ya jumla ya DBPedia KG kwa lugha nyingi za umma na biashara ya viwanda mpya iliyotengenezwa kwa lugha mbalimbali KG imeonyesha ufanisi wa SS-AGA', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی حقیقت ناپدید شده در گراف علم (KG) بسیار مهم است چون KGs مدرن دور از کامل است. به دلیل برچسب\u200cهای انسان\u200cهای زیادی به کار می\u200cرسد، این پدیده در زمانی که برچسب علم در زبان\u200cهای مختلف نمایش داده می\u200cشود، افزوده می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما کامل کردن KG چندین زبان را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، که به عنوان پل تعمیر دانه محدود می\u200cکند، تا علم جمعیت را از زبان\u200cهای متعدد بگیریم. با این حال، تنظیم زبانی که در کارهای قبلی استفاده می\u200cشود هنوز کاملاً استفاده نمی\u200cشود: (۱) جفت تنظیم به همان اندازه رفتار می\u200cشود تا حداکثر تنظیم\u200cهای متفاوتی را به نزدیک فشار دهد، که توانایی KG را نادیده می\u200cدهد. (2) تنظیم دانه کم است و شناسایی جدید تنظیم معمولاً به طریق غیرقابل سرعت است. برای حل این مسائل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش تغییرات گراف adaptive (SS-AGA) را از خود بررسی کنیم. مخصوصاً SS- AGA تمام KGs را به عنوان یک گراف کامل در مورد تنظیم به عنوان یک نوع لبه جدید جمع می\u200cکند. به عنوان این، تأثیر گسترش اطلاعات و صدا در کنار KGs می\u200cتواند با وسیله وزن توجه به ارتباط آگاهی کنترل شود. در ضمن، SS-AGA یک ژنراتور جفت جدید را مشخص می\u200cکند که دینامیک جفت\u200cهای قابلیت تطبیق را در یک پارادیگ خودکنترل می\u200cکند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده بر هر دو DBPedia KG multilingual عمومی و تجارت اکثر زبان\u200cهای صنعتی که تازه ساخته شده\u200cاند KG را به صورت امپراتوری نشان می\u200cدهد فعالیت SS-AGA', 'tr': "Bilim grafisinde ýok faktlary (KG) täze etmek mümkin däldir çünki modern KG-ler tamamlanmagdan uzakdır. Adamlar etiketlemegine görä bu äpişgäniň görnüşi görä bilim edilen dillerde üýtgeýär. Bu kagyzda, biz birnäçe dilli KG tamamlamagyny keşif edýäris, bu iňleri köprüden çykarmak üçin jemgyýetli bilimleri birnäçe dilden uzaklaştyrýar. Ýöne, öňki işlerde ullanýan dil çyzygymy heniz hem ullanylmaýar: (1) çyzygymyň çiňkleri boşatmak üçin parallel zadlary ýapylmak üçin süýtgedýär. Bu kG kapasitesini döwürmekde ýok edýär (2) Täze çyzyglama çykmaz we täze çyzyglama kimligi adatça gürrüňsiz bir şekilde garaşýar. Bu meseleleri çözmek üçin, biz öz-özüne gözleýän adaptiv grafik çyzygyny (SS-AGA) täze bir täze teklip ederiz. Elbette, SS-AGA Täze bir köç türüne göre tüm KG'leri bir grafik olarak birleştirir Şol ýaly, GG tarapynda maglumat täsiri we sesi täsiri görnüşi bilen baglaşykly üns ağırlyklaryndan adatça kontrol edilip biler. Bu arada SS-AGA, kendini kontrol eden paradigmde potensial çizgileri düzenleyen yeni bir çift jeneratörü özelliklerdir. DBPedia KG ile yeni döredilmiş sanat multi dilli e-komerci KG empirik olarak SS-AGA'nin etkinliğini gösteriyor.", 'sq': 'Parashikimi i fakteve të munguara në një grafik njohurie (KG) është vendimtar pasi KG moderne janë larg kompletimit. Për shkak të etiketave njerëzore intensive në punë, ky fenomen përkeqësohet kur trajtohet njohuria përfaqësuar në gjuhë të ndryshme. Në këtë letër, ne eksplorojmë kompletimin e KG-së shumëgjuhës, i cili nxjerr përputhjen e kufizuar të rrjedhës si urë, për të përqafuar njohurinë kolektive nga gjuhët e shumëgjuhës. Megjithatë, përshtatja e gjuhës e përdorur në punët e mëparshme ende nuk shfrytëzohet plotësisht: (1) çiftet e përshtatjes trajtohen në mënyrë të barabartë për të shtyrë në mënyrë maksimale njësitë paralele të jenë të afërta, gjë që injoron pakëndshmërinë e kapacitetit të K (2) Përcaktimi i farës është i paktë dhe identifikimi i ri i përcaktimit është zakonisht në një mënyrë zhurmuese të pazgjidhur. Për të trajtuar këto çështje, ne propozojmë një metodë të re të përshtatjes së grafikut të mbikqyrur nga vetja (SS-AGA). Specifikisht, SS-AGA fusion të gjitha KG si një grafik të tërë duke lidhur me rregullimin si një tip të ri bordi. Si e tillë, përhapja e informacionit dhe ndikimi i zhurmës nëpër KG mund të kontrollohen në mënyrë të përshtatshme nëpërmjet peshëve të vëmendjes të ndërgjegjshme për marrëdhënie. Ndërkohë, SS-AGA paraqet një gjenerator të ri çifti që përfshin dinamikisht çifte të mundshme të renditjes në një paradigm ë vetëmbikqyrur. Eksperimentet e gjera në DBPedia KG shumëgjuhëse publike dhe e-tregtisë e shumëgjuhëse industriale të sapo krijuar KG demonstrojnë empirikisht efektshmërinë e SS-AGA', 'af': "Voorskou ontbrekende fakte in 'n kennis graf (KG) is gekruisig as moderne Kg is ver van volledige. Omdat die werk-intensiewe menslike etiketting, hierdie fenomen verduur wanneer die kennis in verskillende tale verteenwoordig word. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek veelvuldige lingwe Kg voltooiing, wat verwyder beperkte saad lyn as 'n brig, om die kolektiewe kennis van veelvuldige tale te aangryp. Maar, taal oprigting gebruik in voorheede werke is nog nie volledig uitgebruik nie: (1) oprigting pare word gelyk behandel na maksimaal druk parallele entiteite na wees toe, wat ignoreer KG kapasiteit ongelukkig; (2) Saad belyning is skaars en nuwe belyning identifikasie is gewoonlik in 'n gelukkig ongeonderwerp manier. Om hierdie probleme te beëindig, voorstel ons 'n roman self-superviseer adaptief graaf-alignment (SS-AGA) metode. Spesifieke, SS- AGA spasieer alle Kgs as 'n hele graaf deur aanhouding van oplyn as 'n nuwe randtipe. Soos sodat, inligting propagasie en geluid influens oor Kg kan aanpaslik beheer word deur relatie- aware aandagsverke. Gemiddeltyd, SS- AGA funksieer 'n nuwe paar genereerder wat dinamies potensieele alignment paar in' n selfgesien paradigm opneem. Ekstensiewe eksperimente op beide die publieke multitaalske DBPedia KG en nuwe- geskep industriese multitaalske e- commerce KG empiriese vertoon die effektiviteit van SS- AGA", 'am': 'በአውቀት ቀለም (KG) ውስጥ ያልታወቀ ውሸቶች ማቅረብ አዲስ KGs ከፈጸመ ሩቅ ነው፡፡ የድካም አካባቢ የሰው መፈተኛ ምክንያት ይህ ነገር በልዩ ቋንቋዎች እውቀትን በመቀበል ይጎድላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም በብዙ ቋንቋዎች የKG ፍጻሜውን እንፈልጋለን፡፡ However, language alignment used in prior works is still not fully exploited: (1) alignment pairs are treated equally to maximally push parallel entities to be close, which ignores KG capacity inconsistency;  (2) የዘር ክፍል ጥቂት ነው አዲስ የክፍለ ግንኙነት በአዲስ ድምፅ ያልጠበቀ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለመቀናቀል፣ የራሳቸውን ተጠቃሚዎች የግራፍ ቀለም ማቀናጃ (SS-AGA) ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ SS-AGA የKGs ሁሉንም እንደ ሙሉ ቀለም በመስመር ላይ እንደ አዲስ የክፍል ዓይነት ይደረጋል። እንደዚህ፣ በKGs ላይዋ ያሉት የኢትዮጵያ አካባቢ እና ድምፅ የድምፅ ግንኙነት በሚያሳውቀው ሚዛን በመስመር ይችላል፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም የSS-AGA አዲስ ሁለት አዲስ አዲስ አዲስ አዲስ ፍጥረት ማቀናቀል በራሳቸው በተጠበቀው ፍጥረት ውስጥ የቻለኝን ተለይታ ሁለቶችን በመያዝ ያስቀምጣል። በህዝብ ብዙዎችን ቋንቋዎች የDBPedia KG እና አዲስ የተፈጠረውን የኢ-ነጋዴ የኢ-ነጋዴ KG የSS-AGA ጥያቄን በሙሉ ያስታያል፡፡', 'hy': "Գիտելու գծագրում բացակայող փաստերի կանխատեսումը կարևոր է, քանի որ ժամանակակից գծագրերը հեռու են կատարված: Աշխարհում աշխատանքի ինտենսիվ մարդկային պիտակների պատճառով, այս երևույթը վատթանում է տարբեր լեզուներում ներկայացված գիտելիքների վերաբերյալ: In this paper, we explore multilingual KG completion, which leverages limited seed alignment as a bridge, to embrace the collective knowledge from multiple languages.  Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ աշխատանքներում օգտագործվող լեզվի հարաբերակցությունը դեռևս լիովին չօգտագործվում է: (1) հարաբերակցության զույգերը հավասար են վերաբերվում, որպեսզի առավելագույնս խրախուսեն զուգահեռ միավորները մոտենալու համար,  (2) սերմերի հավասարումը հազվադեպ է, և նոր հավասարումը սովորաբար ձայնային անվերահսկվող կերպով է: Այս խնդիրներին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ինքնավերահսկվող ադապտիվ գծագրի հարմարեցման (SS Ա) մեթոդ: Իրականում, SSA-ը միացնում է բոլոր KG-ները որպես ամբողջ գրաֆիա' վերաբերյալ հարաբերություններին որպես նոր ծայրերի տեսակ: Ինչպես օրինակ, տեղեկատվության տարածումը և աղմուկի ազդեցությունը KG-ների միջև կարելի է ադապտիվ վերահսկել հարաբերությունների գիտակցած ուշադրության կշիռների միջոցով: Միևնույն ժամանակ, ՍՍ-ԱԳ-ն ունի նոր զույգ գեներատոր, որը դինամիկ կերպով ընդունում է պոտենցիալ զույգ հարմարեցման պարադիգմայում: Երկու հանրային բազմալեզու DBpedya KG-ի և նորից ստեղծված արդյունաբերական բազմալեզու E-առևտրի KG-ի ընդլայնված փորձերը էմպիրիկապես ցույց են տալիս, որ SSA-ի արդյունավետությունը", 'bn': 'একটি জ্ঞান গ্রাফ (কে. জি) নিখোঁজ বাস্তবতার প্রেরণা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ যেহেতু আধুনিক কে. জি. গুলো সম্পূর্ণ থেক বিভিন্ন ভাষায় জ্ঞানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার কারণে শ্রমিক গভীর মানুষের লেবেলের কারণে এই বিষয়টি বেড়ে যায়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বহুভাষায় কেজি সম্পূর্ণ খুঁজে বের করি, যা ব্রিজ হিসেবে সীমিত বৃষ্টি সীমিত, যাতে বিভিন্ন ভাষা থেকে সংগ্রহে কিন্তু পূর্ব কাজে ব্যবহৃত ভাষার সমন্বয়তা এখনও সম্পূর্ণ ব্যবহার করা হয়নি: (1) স্থানীয়তা জুটিকে সমান চালানোর জন্য সর্বোচ্চ প্যারালেলেটিকে  (2) seed alignment is scarce and new alignment identification is usually in a noisily unsupervised manner.  এই সমস্ত বিষয়গুলোর মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পর্যবেক্ষন করা গ্রাফ স্থাপনের (SS-AGA) পদ্ধতি প্রস বিশেষ করে, SS-AGA নতুন প্রান্তের ধরন হিসেবে পুরো গ্রাফ হিসেবে সমস্ত কেজিগুলোকে মুছে ফেলেছে। যেমন, সারা কেজিগির জুড়ে তথ্য প্রচারণা এবং কণ্ঠস্বরের প্রভাব নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা যাবে সম্পর্কের পরিচিতি সম্পর্কের ওজনের মাধ্যম এদিকে, SS-AGA একটি নতুন জোড়া জোড়া জেনারেটরের ব্যবহার করেছে যারা নিজেদের স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্যারাডিমেন্টের মধ্যে সম্ভাব্য স্বাভা জনগণের মাল্টিভাষায় ডিবিপেডিয়া কেজি এবং নতুন তৈরি করা শিল্পের মাল্টিভাল ই-বাণিজ্য কেজি-এর কার্যক্রমের উপর বিশাল পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে।', 'bs': 'Predviđanje nestalih činjenica u grafiku znanja (KG) je ključno jer su moderne KG daleko od kompletne. Zbog radnog intenzivnog ljudskog etiketiranja, ovaj fenomen se pogoršava kada se bavi znanjem predstavljenim na različitim jezicima. U ovom papiru istražujemo višejezičku završnost KG-a, koja utiče na ograničeno poravnanje sjemena kao most, da prihvatimo kolektivno znanje iz višestrukih jezika. Međutim, poravnanje jezika korišteno u prethodnim radovima još uvijek se ne koristi u potpunosti: (1) pare poravnanja se jednako tretiraju kako bi se maksimalno pritisnule paralelne entitate da budu blizu, što ignorira neskladnost kapaciteta KG-a; (2) poravnanje sjemena je manje, a nova identifikacija poravnanja obično je na bukvalno neodređen način. Da bi se riješili ovih problema, predlažemo novu metodu adaptivnog prilagodbe grafika (SS-AGA). Posebno, SS-AGA spaja sve KGs kao cijeli grafik zbog poravnanja kao novi tip ivice. Kao takav, utjecaj informacija o propagaciji i buki na preko KGs može biti prilagođen kontroliran putem težine pažnje svjesne veze. U međuvremenu, SS-AGA prikazuje novi generator par koji dinamički uhvati potencijalne pare poravnanja u samopouzdanoj paradigmi. Eksperimenti o javnoj multijezičkoj DBPediji KG i novo stvorenoj industrijskoj multijezičkoj e-trgovini KG empirički pokazuju učinkovitost SS-AGA', 'ca': "Predicar fets que falten en un gràfic de coneixement (KG) és crucial perquè els KG moderns són lluny d'estar complets. Gràcies a l'etiquetatge humà intensiv en treball, aquest fenomen es deteriora al manejar el coneixement representat en diverses llengües. En aquest paper, explorem la completació multilingüe del KG, que aprofita l'alliniament limitat de les seves com a pont, per apropar el coneixement col·lectiu de múltiples llengües. No obstant això, l'allinjament de llenguatges utilitzat en treballs anteriors encara no està plenament explotat: (1) els parells d'allinjament es tracten igualment per empurrar al màxim les entitats paralèls a estar a prop, i això ignora la inconsistencia de la capacitat de KG; (2) l'allinjament de les semilles és escas i la nova identificació d'allinjament normalment no és sorollosament supervisada. Per abordar aquests problemes, proposem un nou mètode d'alliniament de gràfics adaptatius (SS-AGA). Especificament, SS-AGA fusiona tots els KG com a gràfic en relació a l'alliniament com a un nou tipus de bord. Com a tal, la propagació de la informació i l'influència del soroll a través de KG es poden controlar adaptadament mitjançant pesos d'atenció conscients de la relació. Mentrestant, SS-AGA té un nou generador de parells que captura dinàmicament parells d'alliniament potencials en un paradigm a auto-supervisat. Els extensos experiments tant en DBPedia KG multillengua pública com en el comerci electrònic multillengua industrial KG recentment creat demostren empíricament l'eficacia de SS-AGA", 'az': "Bilim grafından qeyb olanları təmin etmək müəyyən edilməsi, çünki modern KG tamamlanmışdır. İş şiddətli insan etiketi üzündən bu parçası, elmi müxtəlif dillərdə göstərilmiş olaraq düşər. Bu kağıtda, çoxlu dil KG tamamlamasını keşfetirik ki, çoxlu dillərdən toplam bilgiləri götürmək üçün sınırlı dənələr tərəfindən tərəfləndirir. Ancaq əvvəlki işlərdə istifadə edilən dil tərəzisi hələ də tamamilə istifadə edilməz: (1) tərəzisi çiftləri KG kapasitəsini inkonsistenciyə məcbur etmək üçün, paralel tərəzisi yaxınlaşdırmaq üçün ən böyük tərəzisi ilə eyni tərəfə tərəf çəkilir. (2) əkin çətinlikləri zəif və yeni çətinlikləri tanımlaması genellikle səslə müdafiə edilməmiş bir yolda deyildir. Bu məsələlərə çəkilmək üçün yeni özünüzü gözləyirik, adaptiv grafik tərəfləməsi (SS-AGA) metodu təklif edirik. Şübhəsiz ki, SS-AGA bütün KG'ləri yeni çərçi növü olaraq bütün grafik olaraq birləşdirir. Bütün bunlar kimi, bilgi propagasyonu və səs təsiri KG-lər arasındakı bağlantı təsiri ilə uyğunlaşdırıla bilər. Bu arada, SS-AGA özünün gözləyirlən paradigmdə potensial çəkiliş çiftlərini dinamik olaraq yaxalayan yeni bir çift generatörü tanıyır. DBPedia KG və yeni yaratdığı industriya çoxlu dil e-ticarəti KG'nin etkinliğini empirik olaraq göstərir.", 'cs': 'Předpověď chybějících faktů ve znalostním grafu (KG) je klíčová, protože moderní KG zdaleka nejsou kompletní. Vzhledem k pracovně náročnému označování lidí se tento jev zhoršuje při manipulaci se znalostmi reprezentovanými v různých jazycích. V tomto článku zkoumáme vícejazyčné KG dokončení, které využívá omezené zarovnávání semen jako most, aby přijalo kolektivní znalosti z více jazyků. Nicméně jazykové zarovnání použité v předchozích pracích není stále plně využito: (1) zarovnání párů je zacházeno stejně tak, aby maximálně tlačilo paralelní entity k blízkosti, což ignoruje nesrovnalost kapacity KG; (2) zarovnání osiva je vzácné a identifikace nového zarovnání probíhá obvykle hlučně bez dohledu. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme novou metodu adaptivního zarovnávání grafů (SS-AGA). Konkrétně, SS-AGA spojuje všechny KG jako celý graf tím, že považuje zarovnání za nový typ hran. Šíření informací a vliv hluku napříč KG lze tak adaptivně řídit pomocí vztahových závaží pozornosti. Mezitím je SS-AGA vybaven novým generátorem párů, který dynamicky zachycuje potenciální zarovnávací páry v paradigmatu pod vlastním dohledem. Rozsáhlé experimenty na veřejné vícejazyčné DBPedia KG i nově vytvořené průmyslové vícejazyčné E-commerce KG empiricky demonstrují účinnost SS-AGA', 'et': 'Puuduvate faktide prognoosimine teadmiste graafikus (KG) on otsustava tähtsusega, kuna kaasaegsed KG ei ole kaugeltki täielikud. Töömahuka inimmärgistuse tõttu halveneb see nähtus erinevates keeltes esindatud teadmiste käsitlemisel. Käesolevas töös uurime mitmekeelset KG lõpetamist, mis kasutab piiratud seemnete joondamist sillana, et hõlmata mitme keele kollektiivseid teadmisi. Siiski ei ole eelnevates töödes kasutatud keele joondamine veel täielikult ära kasutatud: (1) joondamispaare käsitletakse võrdselt, et paralleelsed üksused oleksid maksimaalselt lähedased, mis ignoreerib KG võimsuse vastuolu; (2) seemnete ühtlustamine on vähe ja uue ühtlustamise tuvastamine toimub tavaliselt lärmiselt järelevalveta. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja uudse isejärelevalvega adaptiivse graafiku joondamise meetodi (SS-AGA). Täpsemalt ühendab SS-AGA kõik KG-d tervena graafikuna, käsitledes joondamist uue servatüübiga. Seetõttu saab teabe levikut ja müra mõju kõikides KG-des kohanduvalt kontrollida seosteadlike tähelepanukaaludega. Samal ajal sisaldab SS-AGA uut paari generaatorit, mis jäädvustab dünaamiliselt potentsiaalseid joonduspaare enese järelevalve all olevas paradigmas. Laiaulatuslikud katsed avaliku mitmekeelse DBPedia KG ja äsja loodud tööstusliku mitmekeelse e-kaubanduse KG-ga näitavad empiiriliselt SS-AGA efektiivsust', 'fi': 'Puuttuvien faktojen ennustaminen tietokaaviossa (KG) on ratkaisevan tärkeää, koska modernit KG:t eivät ole läheskään täydellisiä. Työvoimavaltaisen inhimillisen merkinnän vuoksi tämä ilmiö huononee käsitellessään eri kielillä esitettyä tietoa. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme monikielistä KG-täydennystä, joka hyödyntää rajoitettua siementen linjausta siltana, omaksumaan kollektiivisen tiedon useista kielistä. Aiemmissa teoksissa käytettyä kielilinjausta ei kuitenkaan vielä hyödynnetä täysimääräisesti: (1) linjauspareja kohdellaan tasavertaisesti niin, että rinnakkaiset entiteetit saadaan mahdollisimman lähelle, mikä ei huomioi KG:n kapasiteetin epäjohdonmukaisuutta; (2) siementen tasaaminen on vähäistä ja uuden tasauksen tunnistus tapahtuu yleensä äänekkäästi valvomattomasti. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta itsevalvottua adaptiivista graafisen linjauksen menetelmää (SS-AGA). Tarkemmin sanottuna SS-AGA yhdistää kaikki KG:t kokonaisuutena tarkastelemalla kohdistusta uutena reunatyyppinä. Tiedon leviämistä ja melun vaikutusta eri KG-ryhmissä voidaan ohjata adaptiivisesti suhdetietoisilla huomiopainoilla. Samaan aikaan SS-AGA:ssa on uusi parigeneraattori, joka tallentaa dynaamisesti potentiaaliset linjausparit itsevalvotussa paradigmassa. Laajat kokeilut sekä julkisella monikielisellä DBPedia KG:llä että vastaperustetulla teollisella monikielisellä E-commerce KG:llä osoittavat empiirisesti SS-AGA:n tehokkuuden', 'he': "צפוי עובדות חסרות בגרף ידע (KG) הוא קריטי כי KG מודרניים הם רחוקים מהשלמים. בגלל תיקון אנושי אינטנסיבי עבודה, התופעה הזאת מתדרדרת כשמטפלים בידע מייצג בשפות שונות. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים את השלמות של קי.ג'י רבות שפות, אשר משתמש בהתאם זרע מוגבל כגשר, כדי לאמץ את הידע הקולקטיבי ממספר שפות. עם זאת, התאמה לשפה שמשתמשת בעבודות קודמות עדיין לא ניצלה לחלוטין: (1) זוגות התאמה מתייחסות באופן שווה כדי לדחוף באופן מקסימלי יחידות מקבילות להיות קרובות, אשר מתעלם מהאי-תואמות ביכולת KG; (2) התאמת זרע נדירה וזהות התאמה חדשה בדרך כלל באופן רעש ללא השגחה. כדי להתמודד עם הנושאים האלה, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה של התאמה גרפית מתאימה (SS-AGA). במיוחד, אס.אס.איי.ג'י מקשר את כל הקי.ג'ים כגרף שלם על ידי התאמה כסוג קצה חדש. ככה, פיתוח מידע ושפעת רעש ברחבי KG יכולים לשלוט באופן מתאים באמצעות משקלי תשומת לב מודעים למערכת יחסים. בינתיים, אס.אס.איי.ג'נרטור זוג חדש שתפס דינמית זוג התאמה פוטנציאלית בפרדיגמה שמשמרת על עצמה. Extensive experiments on both the public multilingual DBPedia KG and newly-created industrial multilingual E-commerce KG empirically demonstrate the effectiveness of SS-AGA", 'sk': 'Predvidevanje manjkajočih dejstev v grafu znanja (KG) je ključnega pomena, saj sodobne KG še zdaleč niso popolne. Zaradi delovno intenzivnega označevanja človeka se ta pojav poslabša pri ravnanju z znanjem, predstavljenim v različnih jezikih. V tem prispevku raziskujemo večjezično dokončanje KG, ki izkorišča omejeno poravnavo semen kot most, da bi sprejeli skupno znanje iz več jezikov. Vendar pa jezikovna poravnava, uporabljena v prejšnjih delih, še vedno ni v celoti izkoriščena: (1) poravnavani pari se obravnavajo enako, da se vzporedne entitete maksimalno potisnejo k bližini, kar ignorira nedoslednost KG zmogljivosti; (2) uskladitev semen je redka in identifikacija nove uskladitve je običajno hrupno brez nadzora. Za reševanje teh vprašanj predlagamo novo metodo samonadzorovane adaptativne poravnave grafov (SS-AGA). SS-AGA zlasti združuje vse KG kot celoten graf tako, da obravnava poravnavo kot nov tip robov. Kot tako je mogoče širjenje informacij in vpliv hrupa v KG prilagoditi z utežmi pozornosti, ki se zavedajo razmerja. Medtem SS-AGA ponuja nov generator parov, ki dinamično zajema potencialne pare poravnave v samonadzorovani paradigmi. Obsežni eksperimenti na javni večjezični DBPedia KG in na novo ustvarjeni industrijski večjezični E-trgovini KG empirično dokazujejo učinkovitost SS-AGA', 'jv': 'Ing pawaran nganggo barang nggo ngerasakno graf (KG) kang alam-alam nganggo KGs modèrn kuwi lungane kabèh durung. Ngomongke nambah kang éngalakno sing larawan, akeh durung kuwi maur diolah ngono nggawe ngerasai tindang sampeyan. Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé nggawe akeh sampek kanggo langgar KG, sing wis nggawe gerakan oleh nggawe winih kanggo nggawe bot, kanggo ngerasai kesempatan kanggo langgar sampek. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness (2) Align to: Ngawe nggawe ngejaraké perusahaan iki, kita supoyo un barêng sami-super-sewiser alignment (SS-ARGA) method. Link Speaking Tanggal, SS-ARGA kang dipunangke sistem sing nyupir dumadhi nggawe OU = VeriSign Trust Network', 'bo': 'གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག གནད་དོན་ལྡན་པའི་མིང་རྟགས་བཀོད་པའི་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་འདི་སྒོ་རྒྱས་ཏེ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག (2) ཆུང་གི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ནི་ཞལ་མོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་གི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་གསར་བ་ནི་ཡང་མིན་ཐང་མེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡིན། དོན་དག་འདི་ལ་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་གོ་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་ SS-AGA་གྱིས་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་གསར་པའི་རིགས་ལ་སྦྱར་བའི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ དེའི་དཔེར་ན། KGs ནང་དུ་གནས་ཚུལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བརྗོད་དང་བརྡ་སྟོན་གྱིས་ཀྱང་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་སྲིད། དུས་ཀྱང་། SS-AGA ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་རང་ཉིད་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཆ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་འཛིན་འདུག Extensive experiments on both the public multilingual DBPedia KG and newly-created industrial multilingual E-commerce KG empirically demonstrate the effectiveness of SS-AGA', 'ha': "QRegExp Dukan labin mutum mai ƙara cikin aikin, wannan abu yana ƙaranci idan managi ilmi ya bayyana a cikin wasu harshe. In a cikin wannan takardan, za mu nẽmi cikakken KG masu mulki, wanda ke ƙarfafa mai ƙayyade zura kamar wani birki, dõmin ya haɗa sanin da ke cikin wasu harshe. Babu kuma, juyin harshen da aka yi amfani da shi a gabãnin aikin aiki ba za'a iya amfani da shi ba: (1) za'a yi amfani da nau'i biyu masu daidaita zuwa an kiyaye abun da inganci da za'a rufe, da kuma ya ƙyale awon KG da inganci; (2) Sura sarki yana da abu mai rauni kuma kan shaidar juya na ɗabi'a, yana cikin wata yaya da ba'a tsare. To, don mu buɗa masu shiryuwa da waɗannan, muna buƙata wata hanyoyi mai tsaro da sigogi na kansa mai adadi (SS-AGA). A ƙayyade, SS-AGA na rubutu duk KGs kamar wata graphi gaba ɗaya da ke cikin juyi kamar wata nau'in gefen sãbuwa. Kamar misãlin, zan iya yin shirin bayani ga information da yin sauri kowace KGs za'a lissafa shi daidai a tsakanin zane-zane-zane-zane. A lokacin da SS-AGA ke ƙunsa da wani matsayi biyu na daban, wanda ke riƙon damƙara kan juyi biyu cikin wata paradigm da aka tsare kansa. Extent jarrabãwa na both umarin DBPedia KG da na-yanzu-halitta industrial multilingura e-commerce KG ya nuna tamkar aikin SS-AGA"}
{'en': 'Accelerating Code Search with Deep Hashing and Code Classification', 'ar': 'نمذجة البنية النحوية الهرمية مع الوضع الثلاثي لتلخيص رمز المصدر', 'fr': "Modélisation d'une structure syntaxique hiérarchique avec position de triplet pour la synthèse du code source", 'es': 'Modelado de la estructura sintáctica jerárquica con posición de triplete para el resumen', 'pt': 'Modelando Estrutura de Sintaxe Hierárquica com Posição Tripla para Sumarização de Código-Fonte', 'ja': 'ソースコードの要約のための三重位置を持つ階層的構文構造のモデリング', 'zh': '用三重态位建模重语法结构以源代码总之', 'hi': 'मॉडलिंग पदानुक्रमित सिंटैक्स संरचना स्रोत कोड Summarization के लिए Triplet स्थिति के साथ', 'ru': 'Моделирование иерархической синтаксической структуры с тройной позицией для суммирования исходного кода', 'ga': "Samhaltú Struchtúr Comhréire Ordlathach le Seasamh Tríúid d'Achoimre ar an gCód Foinse", 'hu': 'Hierarchikus szintaxis struktúra modellezése háromszoros pozícióval a forráskód összefoglalásához', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση ιεραρχικής συντακτικής δομής με τριπλή θέση για περίληψη πηγαίου κώδικα', 'ka': 'ჰიერარიქული სინტაქსის სტრუქტურაციის მოდელირება სამყარო სოციაციაზე Source Code Summarization', 'it': 'Modellazione della struttura sintassi gerarchica con posizione tripla per la sintesi del codice sorgente', 'kk': 'Көздегі код тұжырымдамасының үш түрлі орнымен гиерархикалық синтаксис құрылымын үлгілеу', 'lt': 'Hierarchinės sintakso struktūros modeliavimas su triguba pozicija šaltinio kodo apibendrinimui', 'mk': 'Моделирање на хиерархичната синтаксична структура со три позиции за резултат на изворниот код', 'ms': 'Modeling Hierarchical Syntax Structure with Triplet Position for Source Code Summarization', 'ml': 'സോര്\u200dസ്സോര്\u200dസ് കോഡ് ചുരുക്കം', 'mt': 'Mudellar tal-Istruttura tas-Sintassa Erarkika bi Pożizzjoni Tripletta għas-Sommarju tal-Kodiċi tas-Sors', 'mn': 'Хэрэгцээ кодын тодруулалтын гурван байрлал дээр гиерархик синтаксис бүтцийг загварчлах', 'pl': 'Modelowanie hierarchicznej struktury składni z potrójną pozycją dla podsumowania kodu źródłowego', 'no': 'Modellerer hierarkisk syntaksstruktur med treplett plassering for samandrag av kjeldekode', 'ro': 'Modelarea structurii sintaxei ierarhice cu poziție tripletă pentru rezumarea codului sursă', 'sr': 'Modeliranje hijerarhičke strukture sintaksa sa trostrukom pozicijom za sažetak izvornog koda', 'si': 'මුළු කෝඩ සංශ්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා ත්\u200dරිප්ලෙට් ස්ථානය සමග හියරාචිකල් වාක්ෂික සංවිධානය', 'so': 'Modeling Hierarchical Syntax Structure with Triplet Position for Source Code Summariisation', 'sv': 'Modellering av hierarkisk syntaksstruktur med tredubblingsposition för källkodssammanfattning', 'ta': 'மூல குறியீடு சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'سورٹ کوڈ جماریزی کے لئے تیرپلٹ موقعیت کے ساتھ سینٹکس سینٹکس ساختاری مدل کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ Cấu trúc quét chéo có ba vị trí cho cuộc tổng hợp mật mã gốc', 'bg': 'Моделиране на йерархична синтаксисна структура с тройна позиция за обобщаване на изходния код', 'da': 'Modellering af hierarkisk syntaksstruktur med tredobbeltposition til kildekodeopsummering', 'nl': 'Modelleren van hiërarchische syntaxisstructuur met drievoudige positie voor samenvatting van broncode', 'hr': 'Modeliranje hijerarske strukture sintaksa sa trostrukim položajem za sažetak izvornog koda', 'de': 'Modellierung hierarchischer Syntaxstruktur mit Triplettposition für die Quellcodezusammenfassung', 'id': 'Modeling Struktur Sintaks Hierarkis dengan Posisi Triplet untuk Ringkasan Kode Sumber', 'fa': 'نمادل ساختار سینتکس زیستی با موقعیت سه\u200cگانه برای جمع کردن کید منبع', 'ko': '소스 코드 요약의 삼원조 차원 문법 구조 모델링', 'sw': 'Miundombinu ya Makosa ya Mshindi ya Kipande yenye nafasi ya Ujumbe wa Sheria ya Chanzo', 'tr': '횉e힊me Kod Topla첵y힊y 체챌in 체챌in 체챌in i첵erarhi첵al Sintaks Structure', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Modeling Hierarchical Syntax Structure with Triplet Position for Source Code Summarization', 'sq': 'Modelimi i strukturës së sintaksës hierarkike me pozicionin e trefishtë për përmbledhjen e kodit burimor', 'az': 'Qaynaq Kodu Toplaşdırması üçün Üçüncü Possiyası ilə Hiyerarşik Sintaks Qurğulu Modelləndirir', 'bn': 'সূত্র কোড সামার্মিজেশনের সাথে ত্রিপলেট অবস্থান নিয়ে মোডেলিং হিয়ারারাক্কিল সিন্যাক্স কাঠামো', 'bs': 'Modeliranje hijerarhičke strukture sintaksa sa trostrukim položajem za sažetak izvornog koda', 'ca': 'Modelar estructura de sintaxi hieràrquic amb posició tripla per a resumir el codi de font', 'cs': 'Modelování hierarchické syntaxní struktury s trojitou pozicí pro shrnutí zdrojového kódu', 'et': 'Hierarhilise süntaksi struktuuri modelleerimine kolmekordse positsiooniga lähtekoodi kokkuvõtte jaoks', 'fi': 'Hierarkkisen syntaksirakenteen mallintaminen kolminkertaisella sijainnilla lähdekoodin yhteenvetoa varten', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Modeliranje hierarhične sintaksne strukture s trojnim položajem za povzetek izvorne kode', 'he': 'מודל מבנה סינטקסי הייררכי עם עמדה משולשת לסומריזציה קוד מקור', 'bo': 'Modeling Hierarchical Syntax Structure with Triplet Position for Source Code Summarization'}
{'en': 'Code search is to search reusable code snippets from source code corpus based on natural languages queries Deep learning based methods on code search have shown promising results However previous methods focus on retrieval accuracy but lacked attention to the efficiency of the retrieval process We propose a novel method CoSHC to accelerate code search with deep hashing and code classification aiming to perform efficient code search without sacrificing too much accuracy To evaluate the effectiveness of CoSHC we apply our method \n on five code search models Extensive experimental results indicate that compared with previous code search baselines CoSHC can save more than of retrieval time meanwhile preserving at least of retrieval accuracy', 'ar': 'أصبح تلخيص الكود التلقائي ، الذي يهدف إلى وصف شفرة المصدر بلغة طبيعية ، مهمة أساسية في صيانة البرامج. حاول زملاؤنا الباحثون تحقيق هذا الغرض من خلال مناهج متنوعة قائمة على التعلم الآلي. يكمن أحد التحديات الرئيسية التي تمنع هذه الأساليب من كونها عملية في الافتقار إلى الاحتفاظ بالبنية الدلالية للكود المصدري ، والتي للأسف تم تجاهلها من قبل الدولة من بين الفن. تلجأ المناهج الحالية إلى تمثيل البنية النحوية للشفرة عن طريق نمذجة أشجار التركيب المجردة (ASTs). ومع ذلك ، لم يتم استكشاف الهياكل الهرمية ل ASTs بشكل جيد. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح CODESCRIBE لنمذجة بنية بناء الجملة الهرمية للشفرة من خلال تقديم موضع ثلاثي جديد لتلخيص الكود. على وجه التحديد ، يستفيد CODESCRIBE من الشبكة العصبية للرسم البياني والمحولات للحفاظ على المعلومات الهيكلية والمتسلسلة للشفرة ، على التوالي. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقترح شبكة منشئ المؤشر تولي اهتمامًا لكل من البنية والرموز المتسلسلة للشفرة لتوليد ملخص أفضل. توضح التجارب التي أجريت على مجموعتي بيانات في العالم الحقيقي في Java و Python فعالية نهجنا المقترح عند مقارنته بالعديد من خطوط الأساس الحديثة.', 'es': 'El resumen automático del código, que tiene como objetivo describir el código fuente en lenguaje natural, se ha convertido en una tarea esencial en el mantenimiento del software. Nuestros colegas investigadores han intentado lograr ese propósito a través de varios enfoques basados en el aprendizaje automático. Un desafío clave que impide que estos enfoques sean prácticos radica en la falta de retención de la estructura semántica del código fuente, que lamentablemente ha sido ignorada por el estado de la técnica. Los enfoques existentes recurren a representar la estructura sintáctica del código mediante el modelado de los árboles de sintaxis abstracta (AST). Sin embargo, las estructuras jerárquicas de las AST no se han explorado bien. En este artículo, proponemos CODESCRIBE para modelar la estructura sintáctica jerárquica del código mediante la introducción de una nueva posición de triplete para el resumen del código. Específicamente, CODESCRIBE aprovecha la red neuronal gráfica y el Transformer para preservar la información estructural y secuencial del código, respectivamente. Además, proponemos una red de generadores de punteros que presta atención tanto a la estructura como a los tokens secuenciales del código para una mejor generación de resúmenes. Los experimentos en dos conjuntos de datos del mundo real en Java y Python demuestran la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto en comparación con varias líneas de base de última generación.', 'pt': 'A sumarização automática de código, que visa descrever o código-fonte em linguagem natural, tornou-se uma tarefa essencial na manutenção de software. Nossos colegas pesquisadores tentaram alcançar esse objetivo por meio de várias abordagens baseadas em aprendizado de máquina. Um dos principais desafios que impedem essas abordagens de serem práticas reside na falta de retenção da estrutura semântica do código-fonte, que infelizmente tem sido negligenciada pelo estado da arte. As abordagens existentes recorrem à representação da estrutura sintática do código modelando as Abstract Syntax Trees (ASTs). No entanto, as estruturas hierárquicas das ASTs não foram bem exploradas. Neste artigo, propomos o CODESCRIBE para modelar a estrutura hierárquica da sintaxe do código introduzindo uma nova posição de tripleto para sumarização de código. Especificamente, o CODESCRIBE aproveita a rede neural gráfica e o Transformer para preservar as informações estruturais e sequenciais do código, respectivamente. Além disso, propomos uma rede geradora de ponteiros que presta atenção tanto na estrutura quanto nos tokens sequenciais do código para uma melhor geração de resumos. Experimentos em dois conjuntos de dados do mundo real em Java e Python demonstram a eficácia de nossa abordagem proposta quando comparada com várias linhas de base de última geração.', 'fr': "La synthèse automatique du code, qui vise à décrire le code source en langage naturel, est devenue une tâche essentielle de la maintenance logicielle. Nos collègues chercheurs ont tenté d'atteindre cet objectif grâce à diverses approches basées sur l'apprentissage automatique. L'un des principaux défis qui empêchent ces approches d'être pratiques réside dans l'absence de conservation de la structure sémantique du code source, qui a malheureusement été négligée par l'état de la technique. Les approches existantes ont recours à la représentation de la structure syntaxique du code en modélisant les arbres de syntaxe abstraits (AST). Cependant, les structures hiérarchiques des AST n'ont pas été bien explorées. Dans cet article, nous proposons CODESCRIBE pour modéliser la structure syntaxique hiérarchique du code en introduisant une nouvelle position de triplet pour la synthèse du code. Plus précisément, CODESCRIBE exploite le réseau neuronal graphique et Transformer pour préserver les informations structurelles et séquentielles du code, respectivement. De plus, nous proposons un réseau pointeur-générateur qui prête attention à la fois à la structure et aux jetons séquentiels du code pour une meilleure génération de résumé. Des expériences sur deux ensembles de données réels en Java et Python démontrent l'efficacité de l'approche que nous proposons par rapport à plusieurs bases de référence de pointe.", 'ja': 'ソースコードを自然言語で記述することを目的とした自動コードサマリは、ソフトウェアメンテナンスにおいて不可欠なタスクとなっています。 私たちの研究者の仲間は、様々な機械学習ベースのアプローチを通じて、その目的を達成しようとしてきました。 これらのアプローチが実用化されないようにするための重要な課題の1つは、ソースコードのセマンティック構造を保持していないことです。これは、最先端のソースコードによって残念ながら見落とされています。 抽象構文木(AST)をモデリングすることでコードの構文構造を表現する既存のアプローチ。 しかしながら、ＡＳＴの階層構造は十分に探求されていない。 本稿では，コードの階層的構文構造をモデル化するためのCODESCRIBEを提案し，コード要約のための新規な三重位置を導入する． 具体的には、CODESCRIBEは、グラフニューラルネットワークとトランスフォーマーを活用して、コードの構造情報と順序情報をそれぞれ保存する。 さらに、より良いサマリー生成のために、コードの構造とシーケンシャルトークンの両方に注意を払うポインタジェネレータネットワークを提案します。 JavaとPythonの2つの実際のデータセットでの実験は、いくつかの最先端のベースラインと比較したときに、提案されたアプローチの有効性を示しています。', 'zh': '自代码总之,指自然语言述源代码,已为软件维护中必不可少之任。 吾人试以百机器之学成之。 使此术之不实者,在于无源代码之语义,不幸,为先进之术所忽。 今有法于抽象语法树 (AST) 建模以示代码语法结构。 然AST之层次结构未得其善者也。 本文中,建议CODESCRIBE因引入一新三元组位以拟代码之分语法结构。 具体来说,CODESCRIBE以图神经网络与Transformer分留代码结次第信息。 此外指针生成器网络,网络同时关注代码结构次第标记,以便生摘要。 Java、Python二真数集上实验验吾所言,与最先进之基线有效性。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обобщение кода, целью которого является описание исходного кода на естественном языке, стало важной задачей в обслуживании программного обеспечения. Наши коллеги-исследователи пытались достичь этой цели с помощью различных подходов, основанных на машинном обучении. Одна из ключевых проблем, мешающих этим подходам быть практичными, заключается в отсутствии сохранения семантической структуры исходного кода, которая, к сожалению, была упущена из виду самыми современными разработчиками. Существующие подходы прибегают к представлению синтаксической структуры кода путем моделирования абстрактных синтаксических деревьев (AST). Однако иерархические структуры АСТ не были хорошо изучены. В этой статье мы предлагаем CODESCRIBE моделировать иерархическую синтаксическую структуру кода путем введения новой триплетной позиции для обобщения кода. В частности, CODESCRIBE использует нейронную сеть графа и Трансформатор для сохранения структурной и последовательной информации кода, соответственно. Кроме того, мы предлагаем сеть генераторов указателей, которая обращает внимание как на структуру, так и на последовательные токены кода для лучшей генерации сводки. Эксперименты на двух реальных наборах данных на Java и Python демонстрируют эффективность нашего предлагаемого подхода по сравнению с несколькими современными базовыми линиями.', 'hi': 'स्वचालित कोड सारांशीकरण, जिसका उद्देश्य प्राकृतिक भाषा में स्रोत कोड का वर्णन करना है, सॉफ्टवेयर रखरखाव में एक आवश्यक कार्य बन गया है। हमारे साथी शोधकर्ताओं ने विभिन्न मशीन लर्निंग-आधारित दृष्टिकोणों के माध्यम से इस तरह के उद्देश्य को प्राप्त करने का प्रयास किया है। इन दृष्टिकोणों को व्यावहारिक होने से रोकने वाली एक प्रमुख चुनौती स्रोत कोड की शब्दार्थ संरचना को बनाए रखने की कमी में निहित है, जिसे दुर्भाग्य से अत्याधुनिक द्वारा अनदेखा किया गया है। मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण सार वाक्यविन्यास पेड़ (ASTs) मॉडलिंग द्वारा कोड की वाक्यविन्यास संरचना का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए सहारा लेते हैं। हालांकि, एएसटी की पदानुक्रमित संरचनाओं का अच्छी तरह से पता नहीं लगाया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम कोड सारांशके लिए एक उपन्यास ट्रिपल स्थिति पेश करके कोड की पदानुक्रमित वाक्यविन्यास संरचना को मॉडल करने के लिए कोडस्काइब का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, CODESCRIBE क्रमशः कोड की संरचनात्मक और अनुक्रमिक जानकारी को संरक्षित करने के लिए ग्राफ न्यूरल नेटवर्क और ट्रांसफॉर्मर का लाभ उठाता है। इसके अलावा, हम एक सूचक-जनरेटर नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक बेहतर सारांश पीढ़ी के लिए कोड की संरचना और अनुक्रमिक टोकन दोनों पर ध्यान देता है। जावा और पायथन में दो वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोग कई अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं की तुलना में हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá achoimriú cód uathoibríoch, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige cur síos a dhéanamh ar an gcód foinse i dteanga nádúrtha, tar éis éirí ina thasc riachtanach maidir le cothabháil bogearraí. Tá iarracht déanta ag ár gcomhthaighdeoirí cuspóir dá leithéid a bhaint amach trí chur chuige éagsúla atá bunaithe ar mheaisín-fhoghlaim. Príomhdhúshlán amháin chun na cineálacha cur chuige seo a choinneáil ó bheith praiticiúil is ea easpa struchtúr séimeantach an chóid foinse a choinneáil, rud nach bhfuil dearmad déanta ag lucht úrscothach ar an drochuair. Baineann cur chuige reatha leas as struchtúr comhréire an chóid a léiriú trí na Crainn Chomhréire Teibí (ASTanna) a shamhaltú. Mar sin féin, níl iniúchadh maith déanta ar struchtúir ordlathacha na ASTanna. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid CODESCRIBE chun struchtúr comhréire ordlathach an chóid a shamhaltú trí shuíomh nua triplet a thabhairt isteach le haghaidh achoimriú cód. Go sonrach, déanann CODESCRIBE giaráil ar an ngréasán néarach graif agus Trasfhoirmeoir chun faisnéis struchtúrach agus sheicheamhach an chóid a chaomhnú, faoi seach. Ina theannta sin, molaimid líonra pointeoir-ghineadóir a thugann aird ar struchtúr agus ar chomharthaí seicheamhacha an chóid le haghaidh achoimre níos fearr a ghiniúint. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar dhá thacar sonraí fíor-domhan i Java agus Python éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige molta i gcomparáid le bunlínte úrscothach éagsúla.', 'ka': 'ავტომატური კოდის სიმბოლობა, რომელიც მინდომის მიხედვით თავისუფლიო ენის კოდის აღწერა, მოქმედება პროგრამის მუშაობა. ჩვენი მსგავსი მსგავსი სწავლებელი უნდა გავაკეთოთ ასეთი მიზეზი განსხვავებული მაქინის სწავლების მიზეზებით. ერთი მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილება, რომელიც პრაქტიკური ლეზები არ იყოს სემონტიკური სტრუქტურაციის შეუძლებელობაში, რომელიც ბედნიერად მსოფლიოს სტრუქტურაციის შესახებ, რომელი აბსტრაქტის სინტაქსი ხე (ASTs) მოდელირებით გამოიყენება კოდის სინტაქსის სტრუქტურაციას. მაგრამ, AST-ის hiერაქტიკური სტრუქტურები არ იქნება კარგი განსხვავებული. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ CODESCRIBE-ს პროგრამებით კოდის თერაქტიკური სინტაქსის სტრუქტურაციის მოდელისთვის, რომელიც პრომენტის სამჯერ პოციაცია კოდის სინტ განსაკუთრებით, CODESCRIBE მხოლოდ კოდის სტრუქტურული და სექციური ინფორმაციის შესახებ გრაფის ნეიროლური ქსელის და რვანსტრუქტურის მიღება. დამატებით, ჩვენ მონექტორის გენერატორის ქსელს, რომელიც უკეთესი საზოგადომის შესახებ სტრუქტურაციის და სკენტიური კოდენციალური კოდენციების შესახებ ჩვენი პროგრამის ექსპერიმენტის ექსპერიმენტის ორი რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესახებ Java და Python-ში გამოჩვენება, როდესაც ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობა, რო', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη σύνοψη κώδικα, η οποία αποσκοπεί στην περιγραφή του πηγαίου κώδικα σε φυσική γλώσσα, έχει γίνει ουσιαστικό έργο στη συντήρηση λογισμικού. Οι συνάδελφοί μας ερευνητές προσπάθησαν να επιτύχουν έναν τέτοιο σκοπό μέσω διαφόρων προσεγγίσεων βασισμένων στη μηχανική μάθηση. Μια βασική πρόκληση που εμποδίζει αυτές τις προσεγγίσεις να είναι πρακτικές έγκειται στην έλλειψη διατήρησης της σημασιολογικής δομής του πηγαίου κώδικα, η οποία δυστυχώς έχει παραβλεφθεί από τις σύγχρονες τεχνολογίες. Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις καταφεύγουν στην αναπαράσταση της συντακτικής δομής του κώδικα με τη μοντελοποίηση των αφηρημένων συντακτικών δέντρων (AST). Ωστόσο, οι ιεραρχικές δομές των AST δεν έχουν διερευνηθεί καλά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε να μοντελοποιήσει την ιεραρχική δομή σύνταξης του κώδικα εισάγοντας μια νέα θέση τριπλής για την περίληψη κώδικα. Συγκεκριμένα, το χρησιμοποιεί το νευρωνικό δίκτυο γραφήματος και τον μετασχηματιστή για να διατηρήσει τις δομικές και διαδοχικές πληροφορίες του κώδικα, αντίστοιχα. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε ένα δίκτυο δεικτών-γεννήτριας που δίνει προσοχή τόσο στη δομή όσο και στα διαδοχικά σήματα του κώδικα για μια καλύτερη παραγωγή σύνοψης. Πειράματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικού κόσμου σε Java και Python καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας σε σύγκριση με αρκετές γραμμές βάσης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'Az automatikus kódfoglalás, amely a forráskód természetes nyelven történő leírását célozza, alapvető feladattá vált a szoftver karbantartásában. Kutatótársaink különböző gépi tanuláson alapuló megközelítésekkel próbálták elérni ezt a célt. Az egyik legfontosabb kihívás, hogy ezek a megközelítések ne legyenek gyakorlati jellegűek, a forráskód szemantikai struktúrájának megőrzésének hiányában rejlik, amit sajnos a korszerűség figyelmen kívül hagyott. A már meglévő megközelítések a kód szintaxisszerkezetének megjelenítéséhez használják az absztrakt szintaxisfák (AST) modellezésével. Az AST-ek hierarchikus struktúráit azonban nem vizsgálták megfelelően. Jelen tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy a CODESCRIBE modellezze a kód hierarchikus szintaxisszerkezetét új hármas pozícióval a kód összefoglalásához. Konkrétan a CODESCRIBE a gráf neurális hálózatát és a Transformert használja a kód strukturális és szekvenciális információinak megőrzésére. Emellett javasoljuk egy mutató-generátor hálózatot, amely figyelmet fordít mind a szerkezetre, mind a szekvenciális tokenekre a jobb összefoglaló generálás érdekében. Két valós adathalmazon végzett kísérletek Java és Python rendszerben mutatják be javasolt megközelítésünk hatékonyságát több korszerű alapvető vonallal összehasonlítva.', 'it': "La sintesi automatica del codice, che mira a descrivere il codice sorgente in linguaggio naturale, è diventata un compito essenziale nella manutenzione del software. I nostri colleghi ricercatori hanno tentato di raggiungere tale scopo attraverso vari approcci basati sull'apprendimento automatico. Una sfida fondamentale per evitare che questi approcci siano pratici risiede nella mancanza di mantenere la struttura semantica del codice sorgente, che purtroppo è stata trascurata dallo stato dell'arte. Gli approcci esistenti ricorrono a rappresentare la struttura sintattica del codice modellando gli Alberi Sintassi Astratti (AST). Tuttavia, le strutture gerarchiche degli AST non sono state ben esplorate. In questo articolo, proponiamo CODESCRIBE per modellare la struttura sintattica gerarchica del codice introducendo una nuova posizione tripla per la sintesi del codice. Nello specifico, CODESCRIBE sfrutta la rete neurale grafico e Transformer per preservare le informazioni strutturali e sequenziali del codice, rispettivamente. Inoltre, proponiamo una rete puntatore-generatore che presta attenzione sia alla struttura che ai token sequenziali del codice per una migliore generazione di riepilogo. Esperimenti su due set di dati reali in Java e Python dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto se confrontato con diverse linee di base all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Бағдарламаларды қолдау үшін негізгі тапсырма кодын таңдау үшін автоматты кодты түзету мәселені. Біздің жұмыс зерттеушіміз бұл мақсатты машинаның оқыту көмегімен жеткізу әрекетін көрдік. Бір негізгі мәселе, бұл жағдайларды практикалық болуы мүмкін емес деген көзінің семантикалық құрылғысын сақтауға болмайды. Кешіріңіз, бұл жағдайлардың күй- жағдайлары қалмайды. Абстракты синтаксис бұтақтарын (AST) модельдеп синтаксис құрылғысын көрсету үшін бар жағдайларының көмегімен көмектеседі. Бірақ AST иерархиялық құрылғылары дұрыс зерттелмеген. Бұл қағазда, CODESCRIBE кодтың иерархикалық синтаксис құрылғысын үлгілеу үшін, кодтың күнтізбеу үшін романдық трибуттық орнын келтіріп көрсетеді. Сәйкес, CODESCRIBE график невралдық желі мен түрлендірушісін кодың структуралы және келесі мәліметін сақтау үшін көмектеседі. Қосымша, мәліметтің құрылғысын және кейінгі кодтың таңбаларын жақсы жасау үшін мәліметтің құрылғысын жасайтын меңзер генераторының желігін таңдаймыз. Java және Python дегендегі екі шын әлемдегі деректер жинақтарының тәжірибесі бірнеше суреттердің негізгі жолдарымызды салыстырып көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Автоматска резултатација на кодот, која има за цел да го опише изворниот код на природен јазик, стана суштинска задача во софтверското одржување. Нашите колеги истражувачи се обидоа да постигнат таква цел преку различни пристапи базирани на машинско учење. Еден клучен предизвик што ги спречува овие пристапи да бидат практични е недостатокот на одржување на семантичната структура на изворниот код, кој за жал е пропуштен од најновите. Постојаните пристапи се користат за претставување на синтаксичната структура на кодот со моделирање на Апстрактните синтаксични дрвја (АСТ). Сепак, хиерархичните структури на АСТ не се добро испитани. Во овој весник предлагаме CODESCRIBE да ја моделира хиерархичната синтаксична структура на кодот со воведување на нова тројна позиција за резултат на кодот. Специфично, CODESCRIBE ја користи графовата неврална мрежа и Трансформерот за да ја зачува структурната и секвенцијалната информација на кодот, односно. In addition, we propose a pointer-generator network that pays attention to both the structure and sequential tokens of code for a better summary generation.  Experiments on two real-world datasets in Java and Python demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach when compared with several state-of-the-art baselines.', 'ms': 'Pengringkasan kod automatik, yang bertujuan untuk menggambarkan kod sumber dalam bahasa semulajadi, telah menjadi tugas penting dalam penyelamatan perisian. Rakan-rakan peneliti kami telah cuba untuk mencapai tujuan seperti itu melalui berbagai pendekatan berbasis pembelajaran mesin. Satu cabaran utama menjaga pendekatan ini daripada menjadi praktik adalah kekurangan menyimpan struktur semantik kod sumber, yang malangnya telah diabaikan oleh keadaan-state-of-the-art. pendekatan yang wujud menggunakan untuk mewakili struktur sintaks kod dengan memmodelkan Pohon Sintaks Abstrakt (AST). Namun, struktur hierarkis AST belum dikesan dengan baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan CODESCRIBE untuk model struktur sintaks hierarkis kod dengan memperkenalkan kedudukan tiga-tiga novel untuk pengringkasan kod. Specifically, CODESCRIBE leverages the graph neural network and Transformer to preserve the structural and sequential information of code, respectively.  Selain itu, kami cadangkan rangkaian penunjuk-generator yang memberi perhatian kepada struktur dan token urutan kod untuk generasi ringkasan yang lebih baik. Eksperimen pada dua set data dunia nyata di Java dan Python menunjukkan keefektivitas pendekatan yang kami cadangkan bila dibandingkan dengan beberapa baris dasar yang terbaik.', 'mt': "Is-sommarju awtomatiku tal-kodiċi, li għandu l-għan li jiddeskrivi l-kodiċi tas-sors fil-lingwa naturali, sar kompitu essenzjali fil-manutenzjoni tas-softwer. Ir-riċerkaturi kollegi tagħna ppruvaw jiksbu dan l-għan permezz ta’ diversi approċċi bbażati fuq it-tagħlim tal-magni. Sfida ewlenija li żżomm dawn l-approċċi milli jkunu prattiċi hija n-nuqqas li tinżamm l-istruttura semantika tal-kodiċi tas-sors, li sfortunatament ma ġietx osservata mill-aktar avvanzata. L-approċċi eżistenti jirrikorru għar-rappreżentazzjoni tal-istruttura tas-sintaks tal-kodiċi billi jimmudellaw is-Siġar Abstrat tas-Sintaks (ASTs). Madankollu, l-istrutturi ġerarkiċi tal-ASTs ma ġewx esplorati sew. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu CODESCRIBE biex timmudella l-istruttura ġerarkika tas-sintaks tal-kodiċi billi tintroduċi pożizzjoni ġdida triplet a għas-sommarju tal-kodiċi. B’mod speċifiku, il-CODESCRIBE jiġġenera l-ingranaġġ tan-netwerk newrali tal-graff u t-Transformer biex jippreservaw l-informazzjoni strutturali u sekwenzjali tal-kodiċi, rispettivament. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu netwerk ta' ġeneraturi ta' indikaturi li jagħti attenzjoni kemm għall-istruttura kif ukoll għat-tokens sekwenzjali tal-kodiċi għal ġenerazzjoni a ħjar ta' sommarju. L-esperimenti fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali f’Java u Python juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost tagħna meta mqabbel ma’ diversi linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati.", 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയിലെ സോഴ്സ് കോഡ് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന സ്വയം കോഡിന്റെ ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ സ്വയമായി സംസാര നമ്മുടെ കൂടെയുള്ള പരിശീലിക്കാര്\u200d ഇത്തരം ലക്ഷ്യം എത്താന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത മെഷിനില്\u200d പഠ സോഴ്സ് കോഡിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് കോഡിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും സംരക്ഷിക്കാതിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ സാഹചര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാക്തിക്കക്കാ അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് സിന്റാക്സ് വൃക്ഷങ്ങളുടെ (AST) മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സിന്റാക്സ് സ്ഥ എന്നാലും ആസ്റ്റിന്റെ ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d നന്നായി പരിശോധിച്ചിട്ടില്ല. In this paper, we propose CODESCRIBE to model the hierarchical syntax structure of code by introducing a novel triplet position for code summarization.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, കോഡെസ്ക്രിബി സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ്ങളും സൂക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d വ കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പോയിന്റര്\u200d ജനററേറ്റര്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു നല്ല ചുരുക്കം തലമുറയ്ക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന കോഡിന്റെ  ജാവിലെയും പൈത്തോനിലെയും രണ്ട് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധ്യതയുടെ പ്രവർത്', 'lt': 'Automatinė kodų santrauka, kuria siekiama aprašyti šaltinio kodą natūralioje kalboje, tapo esmine programinės įrangos priežiūros užduotimi. Mūsų kolegos mokslininkai bandė pasiekti tokį tikslą taikant įvairius mašininio mokymosi metodus. Vienas pagrindinių iššūkių, kad šie metodai nebūtų praktiški, yra tai, kad nepaliekama semantinė šaltinio kodo struktūra, kuri, deja, buvo pamiršta naujausiomis technologijomis. Esami metodai naudojami kodo sintaksinės struktūros atstovavimui modeliuojant abstraktus sintaksinius medžius (AST). Tačiau AST hierarchinės struktūros nebuvo gerai ištirtos. Šiame dokumente siūlome CODESCRIBE modeliuoti hierarchinę kodo sintaksinę struktūrą įvedant naują trigubą poziciją kodų apibendrinimui. Konkrečiai, CODESCRIBE naudojamas grafinio nervų tinklo ir transformatoriaus svertas, kad būtų išsaugota atitinkamai struktūrinė ir sekacinė kodo informacija. Be to, siūlome rodytuvų generatorių tinklą, kuriame dėmesys būtų skiriamas tiek struktūrai, tiek eiliniams kodų ženklams geresnei santraukų generacijai. Dviejų tikrojo pasaulio duomenų rinkinių Javoje ir Pythone eksperimentai rodo mūsų siūlomo požiūrio veiksmingumą, palyginti su keliomis naujausiomis bazinėmis linijomis.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл дээр эх үүсвэрийн кодыг тайлбарлах зорилготой автоматтын кодын тодруулалт програм хангамжийн хамгаалалтын чухал ажил болсон. Манай хамт судлаачид машин суралцах сургалтын тулд ийм зорилго олохыг хичээсэн. Эдгээр ойлголтыг практикийн хувьд байхаас хадгалах нэг чухал сорилт нь эх үүсвэрийн кодын семантик бүтэц байхгүй байхаас гадна. Харамсалтай нь урлагийн хувьд хэцүү зүйлийг харсан. Existing approaches are used to represent the syntax structure of code by modeling the Abstract Syntax Trees (ASTs). Гэхдээ АСТ-ын төрлийн бүтэц сайн судалгаагүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид CODESCRIBE-г кодын шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаан дээр шинэ гурав дахин байрлал тайлбарлаж сургаж байна. Ялангуяа, CODESCRIBE нь кодын бүтэц болон дараагийн мэдээллийг хадгалахын тулд график мэдрэлийн сүлжээ болон түрүүгчийг ашигладаг. Мөн бид илүү нарийвчлалтай үеийн бүтэц болон дараагийн кодын тодорхойлолтуудыг анхаарлаа хандуулдаг заагчийн генератор сүлжээг сануулдаг. Java болон Python дэх хоёр бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд бидний санал өгсөн арга хэдэн урлагийн суурь шугамын харьцуулахад бидний хэрхэн үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Automatisk samansering av kodar, som må beskrive kjeldekoden i naturspråk, er blitt ein viktig oppgåve i programvarehandlinga. Våre andre forskere har forsøkt å oppnå slik mål gjennom forskjellige tilnærmingar på maskinelæring. Ein nøkkelutfordring som beholder desse tilnærmingane frå å å vera praktisk ligg i manglinga av å beholda semantiske strukturen av kjeldekoden, som for godt er oversikt av kunsttilstanden. Det eksisterande tilnærminga er korta for å representera syntaksstrukturen av kode ved å modelera abstrakt syntakstråde (AST). Den hierarkiske strukturen av AST er imidlertid ikkje godt utforska. I denne papiret foreslår vi CODESCRIBE å modellere hierarkiske syntaksstrukturen av kode ved å introdusera ein novel treflettplassering for kodsamansering. CODESCRIBE leverer grafen til neuralnettverk og transformerer for å beholda strukturelle og sekvensielle informasjonen om kode. I tillegg foreslår vi eit peikareneratornettverk som betrar oppmerksomheten til både strukturen og sekvensielle teikn av kode for ei betre samandrag. Eksperimentar på to datasett for verda i Java og Python viser effektiviteten av vår foreslått tilnærming når det sammenlignet med fleire kunstbaselinjer.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne podsumowanie kodu, którego celem jest opisanie kodu źródłowego w języku naturalnym, stało się istotnym zadaniem w utrzymaniu oprogramowania. Nasi koledzy badacze starali się osiągnąć ten cel poprzez różne podejścia oparte na uczeniu maszynowym. Jednym z kluczowych wyzwań utrzymania praktyczności tych podejść jest brak zachowania struktury semantycznej kodu źródłowego, co niestety zostało pominięte przez najnowocześniejszy stan sztuki. Istniejące podejścia uciekają się do reprezentowania struktury składni kodu poprzez modelowanie abstrakcyjnych drzew składni (AST). Jednakże struktury hierarchiczne AST nie zostały zbadane dobrze. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy CODESCRIBE modelowanie hierarchicznej struktury składni kodu poprzez wprowadzenie nowej pozycji trójkątów do podsumowania kodu. W szczególności CODESCRIBE wykorzystuje wykres sieci neuronowej i Transformer do zachowania odpowiednio informacji strukturalnych i sekwencyjnych kodu. Ponadto proponujemy sieć wskaźników-generatorów, która zwraca uwagę zarówno na strukturę, jak i sekwencyjne tokeny kodu dla lepszego generowania podsumowań. Eksperymenty na dwóch rzeczywistych zbiorach danych w Javie i Pythonie pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia w porównaniu z kilkoma najnowocześniejszymi liniami bazowymi.', 'ro': 'Rezumatul automat al codului, care are ca scop descrierea codului sursă în limbaj natural, a devenit o sarcină esențială în întreținerea software-ului. Colegii noștri cercetători au încercat să atingă un astfel de scop prin diferite abordări bazate pe învățare automată. Una dintre provocările esențiale pentru a menține aceste abordări practice constă în lipsa păstrării structurii semantice a codului sursă, care, din păcate, a fost trecută cu vederea de către state-of-the-art. Abordările existente recurg la reprezentarea structurii sintaxei codului prin modelarea arborilor sintaxiali abstracti (AST). Cu toate acestea, structurile ierarhice ale AST nu au fost bine explorate. În această lucrare, propunem CODESCRIBE pentru a modela structura sintaxei ierarhice a codului prin introducerea unei noi poziții triplete pentru rezumarea codului. Mai exact, CODESCRIBE utilizează rețeaua neurală grafică și Transformer pentru a păstra informațiile structurale și secvențiale ale codului, respectiv. În plus, propunem o rețea generatoare de pointer care acordă atenție atât structurii, cât și jetoanelor secvențiale de cod pentru o generare mai bună de rezumat. Experimentele pe două seturi de date din lumea reală în Java și Python demonstrează eficiența abordării propuse în comparație cu mai multe linii de bază de ultimă generație.', 'so': 'Qiimeynta iskaa ah oo ku qoran qoraalka kaarka afka asalka ah wuxuu noqday shaqo muhiim ah oo ku saleysan maamulka software. Waxbarashada wadankayada ah waxay isku dayeen in ay dhamaadaan qasti caynkaas ah, si ay u soo gaadhaan qaabab waxbarasho oo machine ah. Hal dhibaato muhiim ah oo ka joojinaya qaababkan si aanay u noqonayn waxyaabaha dhaqdhaqaaqa ah oo aan u baahnayn dhismaha kooxda noocyada ah, taas oo liibaan ka leedahay dowladda farshaxanka. Dhaqdhaqaalaha joogitaanku waxay ka mid tahay mid ka representa dhismaha kaarka ee kaarka, sida loo sameynayo geedaha canshuurta ka soo gala (ASTs). Si kastaba ha ahaatee, dhismaha hierarchical ee AST lama baarayn si wanaagsan. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa CODESCRIBE in aan sameyno dhismaha kaararka ee hierarchical syntax, si aan u soo bandhignayo booska sawir ah oo loo soo bandhigayo kooxda. Specifically, CODESCRIBE leverages the graph neural network and Transformer to preserve the structural and sequential information of code, respectively.  Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu horumarinaynaa shabako wax tusaale ah oo ku dhegaysanaya dhismaha iyo calaamadaha kooxda dabadeed ee qarniga hore. Imtixaanka labada xafiiska ee dunida ee Java iyo Python waxay muujiyaan effektada qaababkayaga la soo jeeday marka la barbarbaranayo wadamo badan oo farshaxan ah.', 'sr': 'Automatski sažetak koda, koji je cilj opisivanja izvornog koda na prirodnom jeziku, postao je ključni zadatak u održavanju softvera. Naši kolegi istraživači su pokušali postići takvu svrhu kroz različite pristupe na osnovu učenja mašine. Jedan ključni izazov koji drži te pristupe da ne budu praktične laži u nedostatku zadržavanja semantičke strukture izvornog koda, što je nažalost pregledala država umjetnosti. Postojeći pristupi koriste predstavljanje sintaksičke strukture koda modeliranjem abstraktivnih sintaksičnih drveta (AST). Međutim, hijerarhijske strukture AST-a nisu dobro istražene. U ovom papiru predlažemo CODESCRIBE da modelira hijerarhičku sintaksičku strukturu koda, uvedenjem novu trostruku poziciju za sažetak koda. Posebno, CODESCRIBE utièe na graf neuralnu mrežu i transformer da bi saèuvao strukturnu i sekvencijsku informaciju o kodu. Osim toga, predlažemo mrežu generator a pokazatelja koja obraća pažnju na strukturu i sekvencijske znakove koda za bolju generaciju sažetaka. Eksperimenti o dva seta podataka na stvarnom svijetu u Javi i Pythonu pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa u usporedbi sa nekoliko stanja umjetničkih osnovnih linija.', 'sv': 'Automatisk kodsammanfattning, som syftar till att beskriva källkoden i naturligt språk, har blivit en viktig uppgift i programvaruunderhåll. Våra medarbetare har försökt uppnå ett sådant syfte genom olika maskininlärningsbaserade tillvägagångssätt. En viktig utmaning för att hindra dessa tillvägagångssätt från att vara praktiska ligger i bristen på att behålla källkodens semantiska struktur, vilket tyvärr har förbisetts av den senaste tekniken. Befintliga metoder använder sig av att representera syntaxstrukturen för kod genom att modellera abstrakta syntaxträd (AST). De hierarkiska strukturerna för AST har dock inte undersökts väl. I denna uppsats föreslår vi CODESCRIBE att modellera den hierarkiska syntaxstrukturen av kod genom att införa en ny trippelposition för kodsammanfattning. Specifikt utnyttjar CODESCRIBE grafens neurala nätverk och Transformer för att bevara strukturell och sekventiell information av kod, respektive. Dessutom föreslår vi ett pekare-generatornätverk som uppmärksammar både strukturen och sekventiella tokens kod för en bättre sammanfattning generation. Experiment på två verkliga datauppsättningar i Java och Python visar effektiviteten av vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt jämfört med flera state-of-the-art baslinjer.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක කෝඩ් සංවේදනය, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක භාෂාත්මක භාෂාත්මක විස්තර කරන්න, සොෆ්ට අපේ සහෝදරයෝ පරීක්ෂකයෝ ඒ වගේ අදහසක් ලැබෙන්න උත්සාහ කළා විවිදිහට පරීක්ෂණය අධ්\u200dයයත්වයෙන්  මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නැති විදිහට තියාගන්න පුළුවන් එක ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියාගන්න, මුළු කෝඩේ සාමාන්තික ස්ථානය නැති විද ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාන වාක්ෂික ක්\u200dරීම (ASTs) නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා. නමුත්, AST වලින් හොඳට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ නෑ. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි CODESCRIBE විශ්වාස කරනවා කෝඩ් සංකේතයේ සංකේතයේ සංකේතයේ සංකේතයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, කොඩ් සංකේතය ස විශේෂයෙන්, CODESCRIBE ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සහ ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සඳහා කෝඩ් ගේ සංස්ථාපනය සහ පස්සෙන් තොරතුරු සුරක ඒ වගේම, අපි පෙන්ටර් ජෙනේටර් ජාලයෙක් සැලසුම් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම හොඳ සාර්මාණ පරීක්ෂණයක් සඳහා සංස්කරණය සහ පර ජාවා සහ පායිතන් වලින් ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සැට් දෙකක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழியில் மூல குறியீட்டை விவரிப்பதற்கு தானாகவே குறியீட்டு சுருக்கம், மென்பொருள் பாதுகாப்பில் முக்கி எங்கள் கூட்டாள் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் இத்தகைய இலக்கை அடைய முயற்சி செய்துள்ளார்கள் பல இயந்திர கற்பனை முறைமைகளி ஒரு முக்கிய சவால்கள் இந்த முறைமைகளை செயல்படுத்தாமல் வைத்துக் கொண்டிருக்கும் பொய்களை வைத்துக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது, துரதிருஷ்டவசமாக மூ தற்போதைய முறைமை ஆயினும், எஸ்எஸ்ஸின் முனைய கட்டமைப்புகள் நன்றாக ஆராய்ந்திருக்கவில்லை. இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் குறியீட்டு சுருக்கத்திற்கு ஒரு புதிய மூன்று முறை நிலையை குறியீட்டு சுருக்கும் பொருட்டு முறை ந குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்டு, குறிப்பிட்ட குறியீட்டின் அமைப்பு மற்றும் மாற்றியமைப்பு குறியீட்டு தகவலை சேமிக்க வரைபடத் கூடுதலாக, நாம் ஒரு புள்ளி உருவாக்கி வலைப்பின்னலை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது சிறந்த சுருக்கம் தலைமுறையில் உள்ள கட்டமைப்பு  ஜாவா மற்றும் பைதான் உள்ள இரண்டு உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களின் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறது சில நிலையில் கல', 'ur': 'سفارٹوفر کی نگہبانی میں ایک ضروری کام بن گیا ہے، جس کے مطابق طبیعی زبان میں سورج کوڈ کا توصیف کرنا چاہتا ہے. ہمارے ساتھی تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے مختلف ماشین کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ اس طرح کا ارادہ کیا ہے ایک کلی چال ہے کہ یہ روشنی کو قابل تکلیف سے روک رہے ہیں سورج کوڈ کی سیمانٹیکی ساختار کی کمی میں، جس کو بدبختی کے ساتھ هنر کی حالت سے دور کر دیا گیا ہے. Existing approaches resort to representing the syntax structure of code by modeling the Abstract Syntax Trees (ASTs). However, the hierarchical structures of ASTs have not been well explored. اس کاغذ میں، ہم CODESCRIBE کو کوڈ کے مقررہ سینٹکس ساختار کی مدل کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، اس کے ذریعہ ایک نوم تیرفلٹ موقعیت کو کوڈ سامنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. مخصوص طور پر، CODESCRIBE گراف نیورال نیٹ ورک اور ترفنسر کو کوڈ کے ساخترکٹ اور سکنویل معلومات کی حفاظت کرنے کے لئے لذت دیتا ہے. اس کے علاوہ، ہم ایک پینٹر جینراٹر نیٹ ورک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک بہتر سامنے کی نسل کے لئے ساختار اور سفارشی کڈ کی نشانیاں دکھاتے ہیں. جاوا اور پائیتن میں دو حقیقی دنیا ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے ہماری پیشنهاد کی تقریبا کے مثبت کو دکھاتے ہیں جب کئی ایست کی بنسٹ لینوں کے مقابلہ میں۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bizning bir necha o'qituvchilarimiz bu qanday qanday maqsadni o'rganishga harakat qilishdi. Bitta muhim murakkab bu murakkablarni ishlatishdan foydalanishi mumkin, manba kodining semantik tuzuvlarini davom etish mumkin. Bi'xshasiz, bu davlat davlatdan o'chirilgan. Name Lekin, AST'ning hierarchik strukturelari yaxshi qidirilmaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz kodlash muhitiyatlari uchun yetarli kodlash tizimini modellash uchun CODESCRIBE rivojlanamiz. @ info: status Ko'pchilik, biz yaxshi kichkina generator tarmoqni tahlil qilamiz, bu tuzuvchi dastur va keyin keyingi kodlash belgini yaxshi kichkina avval uchun muhit qiladi. Java va Pythondagi ikkita haqiqiqiy dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibini tajribalar bir necha holatda bir xil soʻzlar asosiy satrlariga kamaytirilganda ishlatiladigan imkoniyatlarning effektligini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Bản tóm tắt mã tự động, nhằm mô tả mã nguồn bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, đã trở thành nhiệm vụ thiết yếu trong việc bảo trì phần mềm. Những nhà nghiên cứu khác của chúng tôi đã cố gắng đạt được mục đích đó qua các phương pháp máy móc. Một thách thức quan trọng là giữ các phương pháp này khỏi trở nên thực tế là không có cấu trúc ngữ pháp của mật mã nguồn, mà không may là nó đã bị bỏ qua bởi tình trạng hiện đại. Các phương pháp tồn tại được sử dụng để đại diện cho cấu trúc syntax của mã hóa bằng cách tạo mẫu cây tổng (ASS). Tuy nhiên, cấu trúc tầng lớp của AST chưa được khám phá kỹ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị CODESCRBE mô hình cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu tạo của mã. Đặc biệt, CODESCRBE sử dụng bộ đồ thị mạng thần kinh và Transformer để bảo vệ thông tin cấu trúc và chuỗi của mã. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng lưới máy dò đèn cực chú ý đến cả cấu trúc và các dấu hiệu theo chuỗi của mã cho một thế hệ tổng quát tốt hơn. Thí nghiệm trên hai nhà dữ liệu trên thế giới thực ở Java và Python phục hồi hiệu quả của phương pháp được đề xuất khi so sánh với nhiều nền văn nghệ thuật hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното обобщаване на кода, което има за цел да опише изходния код на естествен език, се превърна в основна задача в поддръжката на софтуера. Нашите колеги изследователи са се опитали да постигнат тази цел чрез различни подходи, базирани на машинно обучение. Едно от ключовите предизвикателства да не бъдат практически тези подходи се крие в липсата на запазване на семантичната структура на изходния код, която за съжаление е пренебрегната от съвременните технологии. Съществуващите подходи прибягват до представяне на синтаксисната структура на кода чрез моделиране на Абстрактните синтаксисни дървета (АСТ). Йерархичните структури на AST обаче не са добре проучени. В тази статия предлагаме да моделира йерархичната синтаксисна структура на кода чрез въвеждане на нова тройна позиция за обобщаване на кода. По-конкретно използва графичната невронна мрежа и трансформатора, за да запази структурната и последователната информация на кода, съответно. В допълнение, предлагаме мрежа от показатели-генератори, която обръща внимание както на структурата, така и на последователните токени на кода за по-добро генериране на обобщение. Експерименти върху два реални набора от данни в Ява и Питон демонстрират ефективността на предлагания от нас подход в сравнение с няколко най-съвременни базови линии.', 'nl': "Automatische codesamenvatting, die bedoeld is om de broncode in natuurlijke taal te beschrijven, is een essentiële taak geworden in software onderhoud. Onze collega-onderzoekers hebben geprobeerd dit doel te bereiken door middel van verschillende op machine learning gebaseerde benaderingen. Een belangrijke uitdaging om deze benaderingen niet praktisch te houden, ligt in het gebrek aan behoud van de semantische structuur van broncode, wat helaas door de state-of-the-art over het hoofd wordt gezien. Bestaande benaderingen nemen hun toevlucht tot het weergeven van de syntaxis structuur van code door het modelleren van de Abstract Syntax Trees (AST's). De hiërarchische structuren van AST's zijn echter niet goed onderzocht. In dit artikel stellen we CODESCRIBE voor om de hiërarchische syntaxis structuur van code te modelleren door een nieuwe triplet positie voor codesamenvatting te introduceren. Specifiek maakt CODESCRIBE gebruik van het grafische neurale netwerk en Transformer om de structurele en sequentiële informatie van code respectievelijk te behouden. Daarnaast stellen we een pointer-generator netwerk voor dat aandacht besteedt aan zowel de structuur als sequentiële tokens van code voor een betere samenvattingsgeneratie. Experimenten op twee real-world datasets in Java en Python tonen de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak aan in vergelijking met verschillende state-of-the-art baselines.", 'da': "Automatisk kodeoverskrivning, som har til formål at beskrive kildekoden i naturligt sprog, er blevet en vigtig opgave i softwarevedligeholdelse. Vores medforskere har forsøgt at opnå et sådant formål gennem forskellige maskinlæringsbaserede tilgange. En af de vigtigste udfordringer, der forhindrer disse tilgange i at være praktiske, ligger i manglen på at bevare kildekodens semantiske struktur, som desværre er blevet overset af state-of-the-art. Eksisterende tilgange benytter sig af at repræsentere syntaksstrukturen af kode ved at modellere abstrakte syntakstræer (AST). AST'ernes hierarkiske strukturer er imidlertid ikke blevet udforsket godt. I denne artikel foreslår vi CODESCRIBE at modellere den hierarkiske syntakstruktur af kode ved at indføre en ny triplet position til kode opsummering. Specielt udnytter CODESCRIBE grafens neurale netværk og Transformer til at bevare henholdsvis strukturelle og sekventielle oplysninger om kode. Derudover foreslår vi et pointer-generator netværk, der er opmærksomme på både strukturen og sekventielle tokens af kode for en bedre resumégenerering. Eksperimenter på to virkelige datasæt i Java og Python viser effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang sammenlignet med flere state-of-the-art baselines.", 'hr': 'Automatski sažetak koda, koji je cilj opisati izvorni kod prirodnog jezika, postao je ključni zadatak u održavanju softvera. Naši kolege istraživači su pokušali postići takvu svrhu kroz različite pristupe na temelju učenja strojeva. Jedan ključni izazov čuvanja tih pristupa od praktične laži u nedostatku zadržavanja semantičke strukture izvornog koda, što je na žalost pregledala država umjetnosti. Postojeći pristupi mogu predstavljati syntaksnu strukturu koda modeliranjem Abstrakta Syntaksnog drveta (AST). Međutim, hijerarhičke strukture AST-a nisu dobro istražene. U ovom papiru predlažemo CODESCRIBE da modelira hijerarhičku strukturu sintaksa koda uvođenjem novog trostrukog položaja za sažetak koda. Posebno, CODESCRIBE utječe na graf neuralnu mrežu i transformer kako bi očuvao strukturnu i sekvencijsku informaciju o kodu. Osim toga, predlažemo mrežu generator a pokazatelja koja obraća pažnju na strukturu i sekvencijske znakove koda za bolju generaciju sažetaka. Eksperimenti na dva seta podataka na stvarnom svijetu u Javi i Pythonu pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa u usporedbi s nekoliko podataka umjetnosti.', 'id': 'Persingkatan kode otomatis, yang bertujuan untuk menggambarkan kode sumber dalam bahasa alami, telah menjadi tugas penting dalam pemeliharaan perisian. Saudara peneliti kami telah mencoba untuk mencapai tujuan seperti itu melalui berbagai pendekatan berbasis mesin belajar. Satu tantangan kunci menjaga pendekatan ini dari menjadi praktis adalah kekurangan menjaga struktur semantis kode sumber, yang sayangnya telah diabaikan oleh state-of-the-art. pendekatan yang ada menggunakan untuk mewakili struktur sintaks kode dengan memmodelir Pohon Sintaks Abstrakt (AST). However, the hierarchical structures of ASTs have not been well explored.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan CODESCRIBE untuk model struktur sintaks hierarkis kode dengan memperkenalkan posisi tiga kali novel untuk ringkasan kode. Secara spesifik, CODESCRIBE menggunakan jaringan saraf grafik dan Transformer untuk menyimpan informasi struktur dan sekwensial kode, sesuai. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan jaringan penunjuk-generator yang memberi perhatian kepada struktur dan token urutan kode untuk generasi ringkasan yang lebih baik. Experiments on two real-world datasets in Java and Python demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach when compared with several state-of-the-art baselines.', 'de': 'Die automatische Codezusammenfassung, die darauf abzielt, den Quellcode in natürlicher Sprache zu beschreiben, ist zu einer wesentlichen Aufgabe in der Softwarewartung geworden. Diesen Zweck haben unsere Forscherkollegen durch verschiedene maschinelle Lernansätze versucht. Eine wesentliche Herausforderung, diese Ansätze nicht praktikabel zu machen, liegt in der fehlenden semantischen Struktur des Quellcodes, die leider vom Stand der Technik übersehen wurde. Bestehende Ansätze greifen auf die Darstellung der Syntaxstruktur von Code zurück, indem die Abstract Syntax Trees (ASTs) modelliert werden. Die hierarchischen Strukturen von ASTs sind jedoch nicht gut erforscht. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir CODESCRIBE vor, die hierarchische Syntaxstruktur von Code durch Einführung einer neuartigen Triplettposition für die Codezusammenfassung zu modellieren. Insbesondere nutzt CODESCRIBE das neuronale Graphennetzwerk und den Transformer, um die strukturellen und sequenziellen Informationen des Codes zu erhalten. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir ein Zeiger-Generator-Netzwerk vor, das sowohl auf die Struktur als auch auf sequenzielle Token des Codes achtet, um eine bessere Summary-Generierung zu ermöglichen. Experimente an zwei realen Datensätzen in Java und Python demonstrieren die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes im Vergleich zu mehreren State-of-the-Art Baselines.', 'sw': 'Uhitaji wa kanda za kujitegemea, ambalo linakusudia kuelezea kanuni ya msingi kwa lugha asili, umekuwa kazi muhimu katika upendeleaji wa programu. Watafiti wetu wenzetu wamejaribu kufikia lengo hili kwa kupitia mbinu mbalimbali za kujifunza za mashine. Changamoto moja la msingi la kuzuia mbinu hizi zisizo za kimapenzi ni uongo katika kukosekana kwa muundo wa sekunde wa kanuni za vyanzo, ambao kwa bahati mbaya umekuwa ukimwangaliwa na serikali ya sanaa. Existing approaches resort to representing the syntax structure of code by modeling the Abstract Syntax Trees (ASTs).  Hata hivyo, miundombinu ya maendeleo ya AST haijagunduliwa vizuri. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza CODESCRIBE kuonyesha muundo wa mfumo wa mfumo wa mfumo wa mfumo wa kodi kwa kuanzisha nafasi ya riwaya mara tatu kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa kodi. Kwa hakika, CODESCRIBE inatumia mtandao wa neura na Transfer ili kuhifadhi taarifa za miundombinu na mfululizo wa kodi. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza mtandao wa muungazaji wa kipindi kinachojadili miundombinu na ishara za baadae za kodi kwa kizazi cha muhtasari bora. Java na Python majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu ya mapendekezo wakati ukilinganishwa na misingi kadhaa ya hali ya sanaa.', 'ko': '자동 코드 요약(Automatic code summation, 약칭 Automatic code summation, 약칭 Automatic code summation, 약칭 Automatic code summation)은 소프트웨어 유지보수의 중요한 임무로 원본 코드를 자연 언어로 설명하기 위한 것이다.우리의 연구원들은 각종 기계 학습에 기초한 방법을 통해 이 목표를 실현하려고 시도했다.이러한 방법을 실용적으로 사용하지 못하게 하는 관건적인 도전은 원본 코드를 보존하는 의미 구조가 부족하다는 데 있다. 이 점은 불행하게도 최신 기술에 의해 무시되었다.기존의 방법은 추상적인 문법 트리(AST) 모델링을 통해 코드의 문법 구조를 나타낸다.그러나AST의 차원 구조는 아직 좋은 탐색을 얻지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 코드의 차원 문법 구조를 모델링하기 위해 새로운 삼원조 위치를 도입하는 것을 제안한다.구체적으로 코드의 구조와 순서 정보는 코드의 그래픽 신경 네트워크와 Transformer를 이용해 각각 저장된다.그 밖에 우리는 지침 생성기 네트워크를 제시했는데 이 네트워크는 코드의 구조와 순서 표시를 주목하여 요약을 더욱 잘 생성하도록 한다.자바와 파이톤의 두 개의 실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 몇 가지 가장 선진적인 기선에 비해 우리가 제시한 방법이 효과적임을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'جمع کردن رمز خودکار، که هدف برای توصیف رمز منبع در زبان طبیعی است، یک کار مهمی در حفظ نرم افزار شده است. همکاران تحقیقات ما سعی کردند این هدف را از طریق دسترسی های متفاوت به یادگیری ماشین برسانند. یک چالش کلیدی برای نگه داشتن این روش\u200cها از اینکه دروغ\u200cهای عملی باشند در غیر از نگه داشتن ساختار semantic کد منبع است، که متأسفانه توسط وضعیت هنر غیر نظر گرفته است. نزدیک\u200cهای موجود برای نمایش ساختار سینتکس کد با نمونه\u200cسازی درختهای سینتکس (ASTs) استفاده می\u200cکند. ولی ساختارهای معماری AST به خوبی کشف نشده است. در این کاغذ، ما CODESCRIBE را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که ساختار ساختار ساختار ساختار ساختار کد را مدل کند با توجه به موقعیت سه برابر نویس برای جمع کردن کد. مخصوصاً CODESCRIBE شبکه عصبی و تغییرگر گراف را برای حفظ اطلاعات ساختاری و سفارشی کد به طور مخصوصا تحت تغییر قرار می دهد. علاوه بر این، ما یک شبکه نویسنده اشاره کننده را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که توجه به ساختار و نشانه\u200cهای بعدی کد برای نسل جمعیت بهتر است. تجربه\u200cهای دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی در جاوا و پایتون موثیت روش پیشنهاد ما را در مقایسه با چند خط\u200cهای پایین هنر نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': "Dobiýal dilde kellesi tassyklamak amaçly bolan otomatik köd jemzalamak, programiň keminde esasy zady boldy. Biziň dostlarymyz öz araştyranlarymyz dürli maşyny öwrenmek üçin beýle maksady başarmaga synanyşdylar. Bu golaýlary praktik ýagdaýdan saklamak üçin bir kynçylyk çeşme kodyň semantik ýagdaýynyň ýetmeginde tutmak üçin ýok däldir. Munuň muny boýunça sungatyň durumyndan gaýtalanmady. Abstrakt Sentaks Trees (ASTs) modelleýäniň sintaks strukturyny görkezmek üçin bar ýaly golaýarlar. Ýöne AST iýerarhiýasy ukyplary gowy gözlenmedi. Bu kagyzda, biz CODESCRIBE'i köd toplamak üçin bir täze üçin bir köd üçin iýerarhiýaly sintaks strukturasyny öretmek üçin teklip edip teklip edýäris. Adatça, CODESCRIBE grafiki näyral şebekesini we terjime edip kodyň strukturel we sıralan maglumatyny goramak üçin süýtgedýär. Munuň üçin biz gowy bir topar döredişi üçin işaretçi jeneratöri a ňyna üns berýäris. Jawa we Python içinde iki dünýäde maglumat setirlerinde örän tejribeler biziň teklipimiziň etkinliýetini görkez.", 'af': "Outomatiese kode opsomming, wat doel om die bronkode in natuurlike taal te beskryf, het 'n nuwe taak in sagteware onderhouering geword. Ons mede ondersoekers het probeer om so 'n doel te bereik deur verskeie masjien onderwerp gebaseerde toegange. Een sleutel uitdrukking wat hierdie toegang hou van praktiese leuens te wees in die ontbreek van die semantiese struktuur van bronkode, wat ongelukkig deur die staat van die kuns oorskou is. Bestaande toegang verkry om die sintaks struktuur van kode te verteenwoordig deur die Abstrakte Sintaks Boom (AST) te modelleer. Maar die hierarkiese strukture van AST is nie goed uitgesoek nie. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel Kodeskribe om die hierarkies sintaks struktuur van kode te model deur 'n novel triplet posisie te introduseer vir kode opsomming. Spesifieke, Kodeskribe verwyder die graaf neurale netwerk en Transformeerder om die strukturele en sekwensiele inligting van kode, respektief te bewaar. In addition, we propose a pointer-generator network that pays attention to both the structure and sequential tokens of code for a better summary generation. Eksperimente op twee regte wêreld datastelle in Java en Python vertoon die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang wanneer vergelyk word met verskeie staat-van-kuns basisline.", 'sq': 'Përshkrimi automatik i kodeve, i cili synon të përshkruajë kodin burimor në gjuhën natyrore, është bërë një detyrë thelbësore në ruajtjen e programit. Shokët tanë kërkues kanë përpjekur të arrijnë një qëllim të tillë nëpërmjet metodave të ndryshme bazuar në mësimin e makinave. Një sfidë kryesore për të mbajtur këto qasje nga të qënit praktike është mungesa e ruajtjes së strukturës semantike të kodit burimor, e cila fatkeqësisht është harruar nga state-of-the-art. Përqafimet ekzistuese përdorin përfaqësimin e strukturës sintakse të kodit duke modeluar pemët abstrakte sintakse (ASTs). Megjithatë, strukturat hierarkike të AST nuk janë eksploruar mirë. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë CODESCRIBE për të modeluar strukturën hierarkike sintaksi të kodit duke paraqitur një pozicion të ri të trefishtë për përmbledhjen e kodit. Specifikisht, CODESCRIBE përdorë rrjetin nervor grafik dhe Transformer për të ruajtur respektivisht informacionin strukturor dhe sekuencial të kodit. In addition, we propose a pointer-generator network that pays attention to both the structure and sequential tokens of code for a better summary generation.  Eksperimentet në dy grupe të dhënash të botës reale në Java dhe Python demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar kur krahasohen me disa linja bazë më të larta.', 'am': 'የሜኑባዊ ቋንቋ ቋንቋን ለማሳየት የሚችል የኮድ ማቀናጃ በሶፍትዌር መጠበቂያ የጠቃሚ ስራ ሆኖአል፡፡ ባልንጀራችን አስተማሪዎች እንዲህ ያለውን ምክንያት በብዙ መሳሪያዎች በሚያስተማሩ ደረጃዎች ለመግኘት ሞክረዋል፡፡ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ውሸት እንዳይሆን የሚከለክሉ አንዲት የቁልፍ ውሸት ነው፤ በክፋት የሀገር-አርእስት ሀገር ተለይቷል፡፡ የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች የኮድ ሥርዓት መቆጣጠር ይችላል ምንም እንኳን የAST አፍሪካዊ ግንኙነቶች በመልካም አልተመረጡም፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ CODESCRIBE የኮድ መስመር ማሳየት እናስባለን፤ የኖረብ ሦስተኛ ስፍራን ለኮድ ማጠቃለያ በመግለጥ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ CODESCRIBE በቁጥር እና በክፍለ የኮድ መረጃ ለመጠበቅ የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን እና ትርጉም ይሰጣል። በተጨማሪም፣ ለመሻል አዋጅ ትውልድ እና የኮድ ምልክቶችን ለማስጠንቀቅ የሚያስከትለውን የነጥብ አዋጅ መረብ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በያዋ እና በፕython ውስጥ ሁለት እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታተሮች ላይ ተፈተናዎች ከሌሎቹ የሀገር-አርእስት መሠረት ጋር ተካክሎ የተዘጋጀውን የሥልጣን ሥርዓት ጥያቄን ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': "Doğal dildə mənbəzi kodu təsbit etmək niyyətində olan avtomatik kodu təsbit edilməsi, proqramda saxlamaq üçün əsas bir iş oldu. Bizim yoldaşlarımız müxtəlif maşna öyrənməsi tərəfindən böyük bir məqsəd tapmağa çalışırlar. Bu tərzlərin praktik olmasını qorumaq üçün təklif bir çətinlik çətinlikləri mənbə kodunun semantik quruluğunu saxlamaq üçün istifadə etməkdən çəkindirmək üçün, ki, bədbəxt, sanatın vəziyyəti tarafından keçmişdir. Abstrakt Sintaks Ağaclarını (AST) modelleyici olaraq sintaks quruluğunu göstərmək üçün mövcuddur yaxınlıqlar. Ancaq AST hiyerarşik yapıları yaxşı keşif edilməmişdir. Bu kağızda, CODESCRIBE'nin hiyerarşik sintaks quruluğunu modelleməsini təbliğ edirik, kodu yığışdırmaq üçün yeni üç dəfə pozisyonu təşkil edirik. Xüsusiyyətli olaraq, CODESCRIBE grafik nöral şəbəkəsini və transformatçısını kodun strukturlu və sonrakı məlumatını qorumaq üçün dəyişdirir. Əvvəlcə, daha yaxşı bir istiqamət nəsillərinin strukturlarına və sonrakı kodun işaretlərinə dikkat verən bir işaretçi-generator a ğını təklif edirik. Java və Python'da iki həqiqət dünya verilən quruluğu təcrübə etdiyimiz təcrübələrimizin bir neçə təcrübə quruluğu ilə qarşılaşdığı zaman təcrübə etdiyimiz təcrübələrimizin etkinliğini göstərir.", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় কোড সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ, যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে স্বাভাবিক ভাষায় সোর্স কোড বর্ণনা করার, সফটওয়্যার রেভেন্ডা আমাদের সহযোগী গবেষক বিভিন্ন মেশিনের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে এই উদ্দেশ্য অর্জনের চেষ্টা করেছেন। একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্যালেঞ্জ যাতে এই পদ্ধতিগুলো বাস্তবিক মিথ্যা হিসেবে রাখার অভাবে সোর্স কোডের সেম্যান্টিক ক কাঠামোর অভাবে রাখা হয়ে বিদ্যমান ক্ষেত্রের সিন্ট্র্যাক্স ট্রীসটি মডেল করে কোডের সিন্ক্যাক্স কাঠামোর প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য বিদ্ তবে আস্টির হিয়ারার্কিক কাঠামো ভালো খুঁজে বের করা হয়নি। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা কোড সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের জন্য একটি নোভেল ত্রিবাট অবস্থান চিহ্নিত করার প্রস্তাব প্রদান করি। বিশেষ করে কোডেস্ক্রিবিই কোডের কাঠামো এবং পরবর্তী তথ্য সংরক্ষণের জন্য গ্রাফ নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং ট্রান্সফার্নারের সংরক্ষণ কর এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি পয়েন্টার-জেনারেটর নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করি যা উভয়ের কাঠামো এবং পরবর্তীতে কোডের প্রতীকের দৃষ্টি মনোযোগ দে জাভা এবং পাইথনের দুই বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে যখন বেশ কয়েকটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের মাধ্যমে তুলনা করা হয়, তখন আমাদের প্রস্তাব', 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ կոդի համառոտագրությունը, որի նպատակն է բնական լեզվի աղբյուր կոդին նկարագրել, դարձավ ծրագրային պահպանության հիմնական խնդիր: Մեր հետազոտողները փորձել են այդպիսի նպատակ հասնել տարբեր մեքենային ուսումնասիրությամբ հիմնված մոտեցումների միջոցով: Հիմնական մարտահրավերն այն է, որ այս մոտեցումները պրակտիկ լինելու դեպքում պահպանվում են աղբյուր կոդի սեմանտիկ կառուցվածքը, որը, դժբախտաբար, վերջինս անտեսել է: Գոյություն ունի մոտեցումներ, որոնք օգտագործում են կոդի սինտաքսի կառուցվածքը, մոդելավորելով Աբստրակտ սինտաքսի ծառերը (AST). Այնուամենայնիվ, AST-ների հիերարխիկ կառուցվածքները լավ չեն ուսումնասիրել: In this paper, we propose CODESCRIBE to model the hierarchical syntax structure of code by introducing a novel triplet position for code summarization.  Մասնավորապես, CODESHRIBEը օգտագործում է գծագրի նյարդային ցանցը և Transforme-ը, որպեսզի պահպանի կոդի կառուցվածքային և հաջորդականքային տեղեկատվությունը: Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք ցուցանիշ-գեներատոր ցանց, որը ուշադրություն է դարձնում կոդի կառուցվածքի և հաջորդական նշանների վրա ավելի լավ համառոտագրական սերունդների համար: Java-ում և Պիթոնում երկու իրական աշխարհի տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկած մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը համեմատելով տարբեր բարձր հիմքերի հետ:', 'bs': 'Automatski sažetak koda, koji je cilj opisati izvorni kod prirodnog jezika, postao je ključni zadatak u održavanju softvera. Naši kolegi istraživači su pokušali postići takvu svrhu kroz različite pristupe na osnovu učenja strojeva. Jedan ključni izazov čuvanja tih pristupa od praktične laži u nedostatku zadržavanja semantičke strukture izvornog koda, koja je na žalost pregledala država umjetnosti. Postojeći pristupi koriste predstavljanje sintaksičke strukture koda modelirajući abstraktne sintaksične drveće (AST). Međutim, hijerarhičke strukture AST-a nisu dobro istražene. U ovom papiru predlažemo CODESCRIBE da modelira hijerarhičku strukturu sintaksa koda uvođenjem novog trostrukog položaja za sažetak koda. Posebno, CODESCRIBE utiče na graf neuralnu mrežu i transformer kako bi očuvao strukturnu i sekvencijsku informaciju o kodu. Osim toga, predlažemo mrežu generator a pokazatelja koja obraća pažnju na strukturu i sekvencijske znakove koda za bolju generaciju sažetaka. Eksperimenti o dva seta podataka na stvarnom svijetu u Javi i Pythonu pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa u usporedbi sa nekoliko podataka umjetnosti.', 'cs': 'Automatické shrnutí kódu, jehož cílem je popsat zdrojový kód v přirozeném jazyce, se stalo základním úkolem v údržbě softwaru. Naši kolegové se pokusili dosáhnout tohoto cíle prostřednictvím různých přístupů založených na strojovém učení. Jednou z klíčových výzev zabránit tomu, aby tyto přístupy byly praktické, spočívá v nedostatku zachování sémantické struktury zdrojového kódu, která bohužel byla přehlížena nejmodernějšími. Stávající přístupy se uchylují k reprezentaci syntaxní struktury kódu modelováním Abstraktních syntaxních stromů (AST). Hierarchické struktury AST však nebyly dobře prozkoumány. V tomto článku navrhujeme CODESCRIBE modelovat hierarchickou syntaxi kódu představením nové trojčatové pozice pro shrnutí kódu. Konkrétně CODESCRIBE využívá grafovou neuronovou síť a Transformer k zachování strukturálních a sekvenčních informací kódu. Navíc navrhujeme síť ukazatelů-generátorů, která věnuje pozornost jak struktuře, tak sekvenčním tokenům kódu pro lepší generování souhrnů. Experimenty na dvou reálných datových sadách v Javě a Pythonu demonstrují efektivitu našeho navrhovaného přístupu ve srovnání s několika nejmodernějšími základními liniemi.', 'ca': "La sumarització automàtica del codi, que mira a descriure el codi fonten un llenguatge natural, s'ha convertit en una tasca essencial en el manteniment del software. Els nostres companys investigadors han intentat aconseguir aquest objectiu mitjançant diversos enfocaments basats en l'aprenentatge automàtic. Un repte clau per evitar que aquests enfocaments siguin pràctics és la falta de mantenir l'estructura semàntica del codi fonts, que per desgràcia ha estat ignorat per l'última hora. Els enfocaments existents resorten a representar l'estructura de sintaxi del codi modelant els arbres de sintaxi abstracts (ASTs). No obstant això, les estructures jeràrquiques dels AST no han estat ben explorades. En aquest paper, proposem CODESCRIBE per modelar l'estructura jeràrquica de síntaxi del codi introduint una nova posició triplet a per a resumir el codi. Concretament, CODESCRIBE aprofita la xarxa neural del gràfic i Transformer per preservar la informació estructural i seqüencial del codi, respectivament. A més, proposem una xarxa de generadors de punts que presta atenció tant a l'estructura com a les fitxes seqüencials de codi per a una millor generació de resum. Els experiments en dos conjunts de dades del món real a Java i Python demostren l'eficacia del nostre enfocament proposat en comparació amb diverses línies de base més avançades.", 'fi': 'Automaattinen koodiyhteenveto, jolla pyritään kuvaamaan lähdekoodia luonnollisella kielellä, on tullut olennainen tehtävä ohjelmistojen ylläpidossa. Kollegamme ovat pyrkineet tähän tavoitteeseen erilaisten koneoppimiseen perustuvien lähestymistapojen avulla. Yksi keskeinen haaste näiden lähestymistapojen välttämiseksi on se, että lähdekoodin semanttisen rakenteen säilyttäminen ei ole säilytetty, minkä nykytekniikka on valitettavasti jättänyt huomiotta. Nykyiset lähestymistavat hyödyntävät koodin syntaksirakenteen esittämistä mallintamalla abstrakteja syntaksipuita (AST). AST-arvojen hierarkkisia rakenteita ei kuitenkaan ole tutkittu kunnolla. Tässä työssä ehdotamme CODESCRIBE:n mallintamaan koodin hierarkkista syntaksirakentetta ottamalla käyttöön uusi kolmikkoasento koodien yhteenvetoa varten. Erityisesti CODESCRIBE hyödyntää graafisen neuroverkon ja Transformerin säilyttääkseen koodin rakenteelliset ja sekvenssiaaliset tiedot. Lisäksi ehdotamme osoittimien generaattoriverkkoa, joka kiinnittää huomiota sekä koodin rakenteeseen että sekvenssiin tokeneihin paremman yhteenvedon tuottamiseksi. Kahden reaalimaailman datajoukon kokeilut Java- ja Pythonissa osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden verrattuna useisiin viimeisimpiin peruslinjoihin.', 'et': 'Automaatne koodi kokkuvõte, mille eesmärk on kirjeldada lähtekoodi looduskeeles, on muutunud tarkvara hoolduse oluliseks ülesandeks. Meie kaasteadlased on püüdnud seda eesmärki saavutada erinevate masinõppel põhinevate lähenemisviiside kaudu. Üks oluline väljakutse, mis takistab neid lähenemisviise praktilisest toimimisest, seisneb lähtekoodi semantilise struktuuri säilitamises, mida kaasaegne on kahjuks unustanud. Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid kasutavad koodi süntaksistruktuuri kujutamist abstraktsete süntaksipuude (AST) modelleerimise teel. ASTide hierarhilisi struktuure ei ole siiski hästi uuritud. Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku CODESCRIBE modelleerida koodi hierarhilist süntaksistruktuuri, võttes kasutusele uudse kolmekümne positsiooni koodi kokkuvõtmiseks. Konkreetselt kasutab CODESCRIBE graafiku närvivõrku ja Transformerit, et säilitada vastavalt koodi struktuurset ja järjestikust teavet. Lisaks pakume välja kursorigeneraatori võrgu, mis pöörab tähelepanu nii koodi struktuurile kui järjestikustele tokenitele parema kokkuvõtte genereerimiseks. Kahe reaalmaailma andmekogumiga Java ja Pythoni eksperimendid näitavad meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi efektiivsust võrreldes mitmete kaasaegsete lähtejoontega.', 'he': "סכם קוד אוטומטי, שמתכוון לתאר את קוד המקור בשפה הטבעית, הפך למשימה חיונית בתחזוקת תוכנה. חברינו החוקרים ניסו להשיג מטרה כזאת באמצעות גישות שונות מבוססות על לימוד מכונות. One key challenge keeping these approaches from being practical lies in the lacking of retaining the semantic structure of source code, which has unfortunately been overlooked by the state-of-the-art.  גישות קיימות משתמשות במבנה הסינטקסי של קוד על ידי הדוגמה של עצי הסינטקסי המתוקפים (ASTs). עם זאת, המבנים היררכיים של AST לא נחקרו היטב. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים CODESCRIBE כדי לדוגמא את מבנה הסינטקס הייררכי של קוד על ידי להציג עמדה חדשה שלישית לסומריזציה קוד. במיוחד, CODESCRIBE משתמש ברשת העצבים של הגרף ומעבר כדי לשמור על מידע המבנה והמידע רצופי של קוד, בהתאם. בנוסף, אנו מציעים רשת גנרטור-מצביעים שמשמרת תשומת לב גם למבנה וגם לסימנים רצופיים של קוד לדור סכם טוב יותר. ניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי בג'אבה ופיטון מראים את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת שלנו בהשוואה לכמה קווי בסיס מצוינים.", 'ha': "Kurarin kodi na farat ɗaya, wanda ke shirya wa bayyana kodi na asali cikin harshen, ya kasance wani aikin muhimu a cikin tsarin kwamfyutan tebur. Our fellow researchers have attempted to achieve such a purpose through various machine learning-based approaches.  Babu kima ta kange waɗannan hanyõyin su daga zama masu aikin ƙwarai da kuma bã ya riƙon tsari da kodi na ƙaranci, da bahati'a, an rufe shi daga halin-the-art. @ action: button Haƙĩƙa, ba a jarraba hiirarchical layuka na ATS ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗar da CODASCRIBU, ko za'a motsar matsayin taƙaitar koda da da za'a introduce wani wurin na node ta sau biyu wa kurarinsa. A ƙayyade, CODASCRIBU na samar da shirin Naural na grafi da Transformer dõmin a tsare masu tsari na rubutu da bayan maɓallin kode. Da wannan, Munã goyyar da wata wagon mai nuna-mai shiri da ke kiya masu saurãre zuwa duk rubutun da symboli na dabam wa kodi wa kizaluman ƙarami mai kyau. Java da Python, jarrabõ biyu masu gaske a cikin data masu cikin duniya biyu na gaske, sun nuna aikin mazaɓa na hanyoyinmu da aka yi niyyar da su sammenliki da several state-of-the-art-lines.", 'sk': 'Avtomatsko povzemanje kode, katere cilj je opis izvorne kode v naravnem jeziku, je postalo bistvena naloga pri vzdrževanju programske opreme. Naši kolegi raziskovalci so poskušali doseči ta namen z različnimi pristopi, ki temeljijo na strojnem učenju. Eden ključnih izzivov, ki preprečujejo, da bi bili ti pristopi praktični, je pomanjkanje ohranjanja semantične strukture izvorne kode, kar je žal spregledalo najsodobnejši. Obstoječi pristopi se zatečejo k predstavitvi sintaksne strukture kode z modeliranjem abstraktnih sintaksnih dreves (AST). Vendar hierarhične strukture AST niso bile dobro raziskane. V tem prispevku predlagamo CODESCRIBE za modeliranje hierarhične sintakse strukture kode z uvedbo novega položaja trojk za povzetek kode. Natančneje CODESCRIBE uporablja grafsko nevronsko omrežje in transformator za ohranitev strukturnih in zaporednih informacij kode. Poleg tega predlagamo omrežje kazalcev-generatorjev, ki posveča pozornost tako strukturi kot zaporednim žetonom kode za boljšo generacijo povzetkov. Eksperimenti na dveh resničnih naborih podatkov v Java in Python dokazujejo učinkovitost našega predlaganega pristopa v primerjavi z več najsodobnejšimi osnovnimi linijami.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan kelas Nalika kamulyan sing paling nggambar nggawe biasa nggawe dolanan ngono kuwi sampeyan karo sistem sing paling nggambar Ombudhakan wong njaluk sing beraksi akeh nyong nggawe praksi kuwi ora ono nggawe nguasai sistem sematik sing perbudhakan kode politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging, akeh akeh akeh sistem anyar AST ora bisa diandelak bon Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyo "COMDEscRIBE" nggawe model model kebutuhan seneng sistem anyar nggawe barang kotak dadi nyong, nyong ngewehku arep mbubuti layang kotak tentang kanggo sumulasi kode. Speaking Nambah, kita suggerusan red Punter-Generor sing dumadhi nggawe aturan tapi nggawe sistem lan sembaran sing berarti kok kanggo kelangan resmi sing luwih apik. Isoporsanti karo data sing nyipki iki banget kanggo Jawa karo Piton kuwi bisalahan kanggo ngomongke efekasi kanggo dianggap sing nyipke sampek karo perusahaan-perusahaan langkung sampek karo hal-perusahaan sing paling-perusahaan', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཨང་ཆ་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་པ། དེ་ནི་རང་བཞིན་ཡུལ ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་ལས་རྩོལ་ཞིབ་གྱིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་གྱིས་འགྲོ་བ་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བྱེད་རྩོལ་བ་ཡིན། གལ་ཆེན་གཅིག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་གིས་ལག་ལེན་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་འདི་དག་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྩ་འབྱུང་རིས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་རིམ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཉར་འཇོག་ནུས་མེད་དུ་འཇོག་ Existing approaches resort to representing the syntax structure of code by modeling the Abstract Syntax Trees (ASTs). ཡིན་ནའང་། ཨ་སི་ཁི་(AST)ཡི་མཛུག་ཁུང་གི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དེ་ཚོར་སྟབས་བདེ་ལེན་ཞིབ་བྱས་མེད། In this paper, we propose CODESCRIBE to model the hierarchical syntax structure of code by introducing a novel triplet position for code summarization. Specifically, CODESCRIBE leverages the graph neural network and Transformer to preserve the structural and sequential information of code, respectively. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཇུག་བསྡུར་བའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་། Java དང་པེ་ཐོག་ཏུ་འཛམ་གླིང་གནས་སྟངས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Learning Disentangled Textual Representations via Statistical Measures of Similarity', 'ar': 'FewNLU: المقارنة المعيارية لأحدث الأساليب لفهم اللغة الطبيعية قليل اللقطات', 'fr': 'FeWnLu\xa0: analyse comparative de méthodes de pointe pour une compréhension en petit nombre du langage naturel', 'pt': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking de métodos de última geração para compreensão de linguagem natural de poucas fotos', 'es': 'FewnLU: Evaluación comparativa de métodos de vanguardia para la comprensión del lenguaje natural de pocos pasos', 'ja': 'FewNLU ：自然言語理解のための最先端の方法のベンチマーク', 'hi': 'FewNLU: कुछ शॉट प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ के लिए राज्य के कला विधियों बेंचमार्किंग', 'zh': 'FewNLU曰:少数自然语言解最新准之', 'ru': 'FewNLU: Сравнение Современных Методов для Понимания Природного Языка Несколько-Shot', 'ga': 'Is beagNLU: Tagarmharcáil Modhanna Nua-Aimseartha le hAghaidh Beagán Tuiscint Teanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'el': 'Λίγες μέθοδοι αναφοράς για την κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'FehNLU: A legkorszerűbb módszerek összehasonlítása a néhány lövéses természetes nyelv megértéséhez', 'it': "FewNLU: Benchmarking di metodi all'avanguardia per la comprensione del linguaggio naturale a pochi colpi", 'kk': 'FewNLU: Банкмаркинг күйі- of- the- Art Methods for Few- Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'lt': 'KeletaNLU: Mažai nuotraukų supratimo gamtinėmis kalbomis metodų lyginamasis vertinimas', 'mk': 'Неколку NLU: Методии за научно разбирање на природниот јазик', 'ms': 'NLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'ml': 'FewNLU: കുറച്ചു ഷൂട്ട് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള ബെന്\u200dമെങ്കിങ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- ഓഫ്- ആ- ആര്\u200dട്ട് രീതികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'FtitNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'mn': 'FewNLU', 'no': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'pl': 'FewnNLU: Porównanie najnowocześniejszych metod dla niewielkiego zrozumienia języka naturalnego', 'ro': 'Câțiva NLU: Analiza comparativă a metodelor de ultimă generație pentru înțelegerea limbajului natural', 'sr': 'FewNLU: Nabavljanje nacionalnih metoda umetnosti za razumevanje prirodnog jezika.', 'so': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'si': 'FewNLU: BenchMarking state-of-the-Art Metodos for Few-Shot Native language Understanding', 'ta': 'FewNLU: சிறிய ஷாட் இயல்பான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் நிலை- of- the- Art முறைமை', 'sv': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking av state-of-the-art metoder för few-shot naturligt språkförståelse', 'ur': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'uz': 'QWebPage', 'vi': 'Liên Minh: Dùng cách chuẩn bị cho hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'bg': 'Сравнителен анализ на съвременните методи за малко разбиране на естествения език', 'nl': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art methoden voor weinig-shot natuurlijke taal begrijpen', 'da': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking af state-of-the-art metoder til few-shot natursprogforståelse', 'hr': 'FewNLU: Nabavljanje nacionalnih metoda umjetnosti za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika', 'de': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methoden für das Verständnis natürlicher Sprache', 'ko': 'FewNLU: 자연 언어 이해를 위한 최첨단 기준 테스트 방법 제공', 'id': 'Beberapa NLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'fa': 'FewNLU: نقشه\u200cبندی روش\u200cهای هنر برای تعلیم زبان طبیعی کمی', 'sw': 'FewNLU: Utawala wa Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods of the Art for Chache Shot Natural Understanding', 'tr': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'af': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'am': 'benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural language Understanding', 'hy': 'Մի քանիսը', 'sq': 'Pak NLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'bn': 'ফিউএনএলউ: কয়েকটি শট প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বুঝতে ব্যাঙ্কেঙ্কিং রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতি', 'bs': 'FewNLU: Premjerenje nacionalnih metoda umjetnosti za razumijevanje prirodnog jezika.', 'az': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'ca': "Poques NLU: Comparar mètodes d'estat de l'art per a entendre pocs tiros del llenguatge natural", 'cs': 'FewnNLU: srovnávání nejmodernějších metod pro porozumění přirozenému jazyku', 'fi': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State of the Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'et': 'FewNLU: võrdlusanalüüs state-of-the-art meetodid vähese pildi loodusliku keele mõistmiseks', 'jv': 'FewNLU: Bench marking state-of-the-Art Methods for Few-shot Normal Language Competition', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'FewNLU: Primerjalna analiza najsodobnejših metod za razumevanje naravnega jezika', 'bo': 'FewNLU: Benchmarking State-of-the-Art Methods for Few-Shot Natural Language Understanding', 'he': 'מעט NLU: שיטות המדינה של האמנות'}
{'en': 'When working with textual data a natural application of disentangled representations is the fair classification where the goal is to make predictions without being biased or influenced by sensible attributes that may be present in the data e.g. age gender or race Dominant approaches to disentangle a sensitive attribute from textual representations rely on learning simultaneously a penalization term that involves either an adversary loss e.g. a discriminator or an information measure e.g. mutual information However these methods require the training of a deep neural network with several parameter updates for each update of the representation model As a matter of fact the resulting nested optimization loop is both times consuming adding complexity to the optimization dynamic and requires a fine hyperparameter selection e.g. learning rates architecture In this work we introduce a family of regularizers for learning disentangled representations that do not require training These regularizers are based on statistical measures of similarity between the conditional probability distributions with respect to the sensible attributes Our novel regularizers do not require additional training are faster and do not involve additional tuning while achieving better results both when combined with pretrained and randomly initialized text encoders', 'ar': 'اجتذبت مهمة فهم اللغة الطبيعية (NLU) التي تتطلب القليل من اللقطات اهتمامًا كبيرًا في الآونة الأخيرة. ومع ذلك ، فقد تم تقييم الأساليب السابقة بموجب مجموعة متباينة من البروتوكولات ، مما يعيق المقارنة العادلة وقياس التقدم في المجال. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقدم إطار عمل تقييمي يعمل على تحسين إجراءات التقييم السابقة في ثلاثة جوانب رئيسية ، أي أداء الاختبار ، وترابط اختبار التطوير ، والاستقرار. ضمن إطار عمل التقييم الجديد هذا ، نعيد تقييم العديد من الأساليب الحديثة ذات اللقطات القليلة لمهام NLU. يكشف إطار عملنا عن رؤى جديدة: (1) لم يتم تقدير كل من الأداء المطلق والفجوة النسبية للطرق بدقة في الأدبيات السابقة ؛ (2) لا توجد طريقة واحدة تهيمن على معظم المهام بأداء ثابت ؛ (3) تتضاءل تحسينات بعض الأساليب مع نموذج أكبر تم اختباره مسبقًا ؛ و (4) المكاسب من الطرق المختلفة غالبًا ما تكون مكملة وأفضل نموذج مشترك يعمل بالقرب من خط الأساس القوي الخاضع للإشراف الكامل. نفتح مجموعة أدواتنا ، FewNLU ، التي تنفذ إطار عمل التقييم الخاص بنا جنبًا إلى جنب مع عدد من الأساليب الحديثة.', 'fr': "La tâche de compréhension du langage naturel (NLU) en quelques étapes a récemment attiré l'attention. Cependant, les méthodes antérieures ont été évaluées selon un ensemble disparate de protocoles, ce qui rend difficile la comparaison équitable et la mesure des progrès réalisés sur le terrain. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous introduisons un cadre d'évaluation qui améliore les procédures d'évaluation précédentes dans trois aspects clés, à savoir les performances des tests, la corrélation développ-test et la stabilité. Dans le cadre de ce nouveau cadre d'évaluation, nous réévaluons plusieurs méthodes de pointe pour les tâches NLU. Notre cadre révèle de nouvelles perspectives\xa0: (1) la performance absolue et l'écart relatif des méthodes n'ont pas été estimés avec précision dans la littérature antérieure\xa0; (2) aucune méthode ne domine la plupart des tâches avec des performances constantes\xa0; (3) les améliorations de certaines méthodes diminuent avec un modèle préentraîné plus large\xa0; et (4) les gains à partir de différentes méthodes sont souvent complémentaires et le meilleur modèle combiné fonctionne près d'une base de référence solide entièrement supervisée. Nous avons opensource notre boîte à outils, FeWnLu, qui met en œuvre notre cadre d'évaluation ainsi qu'un certain nombre de méthodes de pointe.", 'es': 'La tarea de pocos intentos de comprensión del lenguaje natural (NLU) ha atraído mucha atención recientemente. Sin embargo, los métodos anteriores se han evaluado bajo un conjunto dispar de protocolos, lo que dificulta la comparación justa y la medición del progreso del campo. Para abordar este problema, introducimos un marco de evaluación que mejora los procedimientos de evaluación anteriores en tres aspectos clave, es decir, el rendimiento de las pruebas, la correlación entre desarrolladores y la estabilidad. Bajo este nuevo marco de evaluación, reevaluamos varios métodos de última generación para las tareas de NLU. Nuestro marco revela nuevos conocimientos: (1) tanto el rendimiento absoluto como la brecha relativa de los métodos no se estimaron con precisión en la literatura anterior; (2) ningún método único domina la mayoría de las tareas con un rendimiento constante; (3) las mejoras de algunos métodos disminuyen con un modelo más grande previamente entrenado; y (4) ganancias de diferentes métodos son a menudo complementarios y el mejor modelo combinado funciona cerca de una sólida línea de base totalmente supervisada. Hacemos de código abierto nuestro kit de herramientas, FewNLU, que implementa nuestro marco de evaluación junto con una serie de métodos de última generación.', 'pt': 'A tarefa de compreensão de linguagem natural de poucos tiros (NLU) atraiu muita atenção recentemente. No entanto, métodos anteriores foram avaliados sob um conjunto díspar de protocolos, o que dificulta a comparação justa e a medição do progresso do campo. Para resolver esse problema, apresentamos uma estrutura de avaliação que melhora os procedimentos de avaliação anteriores em três aspectos principais, ou seja, desempenho de teste, correlação dev-teste e estabilidade. Sob essa nova estrutura de avaliação, reavaliamos vários métodos de poucos tiros de última geração para tarefas NLU. Nossa estrutura revela novos insights: (1) tanto o desempenho absoluto quanto a lacuna relativa dos métodos não foram estimados com precisão na literatura anterior; (2) nenhum método único domina a maioria das tarefas com desempenho consistente; (3) as melhorias de alguns métodos diminuem com um modelo pré-treinado maior; e (4) os ganhos de diferentes métodos são frequentemente complementares e o melhor modelo combinado tem um desempenho próximo a uma linha de base totalmente supervisionada. Abrimos o código-fonte de nosso kit de ferramentas, FewNLU, que implementa nossa estrutura de avaliação junto com vários métodos de última geração.', 'zh': '自然语言解(NLU)事近多所关注。 然前法已于协议下为评估,此格平较量该领之进也。 入一评估框架,框架三要改入前评,即试性能、开发-试相关性稳定性。 新评框架下,重估数种NLU务先进少数镜头法。 臣等框架揭新见:(1)此绝对性与相对,前文无准。  (2)无一法以一性主多务。  (3)其法改进随大预练模而减之; (4)异术者益常互补,至善近强者督基线。 吾开源吾工具包FewNLU,得吾评框架及先进之法。', 'ru': 'Задача изучения естественного языка (NLU) привлекла много внимания в последнее время. Однако предыдущие методы были оценены в соответствии с разными протоколами, что препятствует справедливому сопоставлению и измерению прогресса в данной области. Для решения этой проблемы мы вводим систему оценки, которая улучшает предыдущие процедуры оценки по трем ключевым аспектам, т.е. производительность теста, корреляция dev-тестов и стабильность. В рамках этой новой системы оценки мы переоцениваем несколько современных методов с небольшим числом кадров для задач НЛУ. Наша система раскрывает новые идеи:  (1) как абсолютная производительность, так и относительный разрыв методов не были точно оценены в предыдущей литературе;  (2) ни один метод не доминирует в большинстве задач с последовательной производительностью;  (3) улучшения некоторых методов уменьшаются с большей предварительно подготовленной моделью; и (4) выгоды от различных методов часто являются взаимодополняющими, и лучшая комбинированная модель работает близко к сильной полностью контролируемой базовой линии. Мы используем наш инструментарий FewNLU с открытым исходным кодом, который реализует нашу систему оценки наряду с рядом современных методов.', 'hi': 'कुछ-शॉट प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ (एनएलयू) कार्य ने हाल ही में ध्यान आकर्षित किया है। हालांकि, प्रोटोकॉल के एक अलग सेट के तहत पूर्व विधियों का मूल्यांकन किया गया है, जो उचित तुलना और क्षेत्र की प्रगति को मापने में बाधा डालता है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम एक मूल्यांकन रूपरेखा पेश करते हैं जो तीन प्रमुख पहलुओं में पिछली मूल्यांकन प्रक्रियाओं में सुधार करता है, यानी, परीक्षण प्रदर्शन, देव-परीक्षण सहसंबंध और स्थिरता। इस नए मूल्यांकन ढांचे के तहत, हम एनएलयू कार्यों के लिए कई अत्याधुनिक कुछ-शॉट विधियों का पुनर्मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारा ढांचा नई अंतर्दृष्टि को प्रकट करता है: (1) विधियों के पूर्ण प्रदर्शन और सापेक्ष अंतर दोनों को पूर्व साहित्य में सटीक रूप से अनुमान नहीं लगाया गया था;  (2) कोई भी एकल विधि लगातार प्रदर्शन के साथ अधिकांश कार्यों पर हावी नहीं है;  (3) कुछ तरीकों के सुधार एक बड़े pretrained मॉडल के साथ कम हो जाते हैं; और (4) विभिन्न तरीकों से लाभ अक्सर पूरक होते हैं और सबसे अच्छा संयुक्त मॉडल एक मजबूत पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित आधार रेखा के करीब प्रदर्शन करता है। हम अपने टूलकिट, FewNLU को खोलते हैं, जो कई अत्याधुनिक तरीकों के साथ हमारे मूल्यांकन ढांचे को लागू करता है।', 'ja': '数少ない自然言語理解（ NLU ）タスクは、最近多くの注目を集めています。 しかしながら、既存の方法は、異なる一連のプロトコルの下で評価されており、これは、公平な比較および分野の進捗の測定を妨げている。 この問題に対処するために、テストのパフォーマンス、開発テストの相関性、安定性の3つの重要な側面で以前の評価手順を改善する評価フレームワークを導入します。 この新しい評価フレームワークの下で、私たちはNLUタスクのためのいくつかの最先端の数少ない方法を再評価します。 私たちのフレームワークは、次の新しい洞察を明らかにします。（ 1 ）方法の絶対的なパフォーマンスと相対的なギャップの両方が以前の文献で正確に推定されなかった； （ 2 ）単一の方法が一貫したパフォーマンスでほとんどのタスクを支配していない； （ 3 ）いくつかの方法の改善は、より大きな事前に訓練されたモデルで減少する； （ 4 ）異なる方法からの利得はしばしば相補的であり、最良の組み合わせのモデルは、強力で完全に監督されたベースラインに近いパフォーマンスを発揮する。 数々の最先端のメソッドと共に評価フレームワークを実装するツールキットFewNLUをオープンソース化しています。', 'ga': 'Is iomaí aird a tarraingíodh le déanaí ar an tasc cúpla seat de thuiscint teanga nádúrtha (NLU). Mar sin féin, rinneadh meastóireacht ar mhodhanna roimhe seo faoi shraith dhifriúil de phrótacail, rud a chuireann bac ar chomparáid chothrom agus ar dhul chun cinn an réimse a thomhas. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, tugaimid isteach creat meastóireachta a fheabhsaíonn nósanna imeachta meastóireachta roimhe seo i dtrí phríomhghné, i.e., feidhmíocht tástála, comhghaolú tástála-dv, agus cobhsaíocht. Faoin gcreat meastóireachta nua seo, déanaimid athmheastóireacht ar roinnt modhanna cúpla seat den scoth le haghaidh tascanna NLU. Nochtann ár gcreat léargais nua: (1) ní raibh idir fheidhmíocht iomlán agus bearna choibhneasta na modhanna measta go cruinn sa litríocht roimhe seo; (2) níl aon mhodh amháin chun tosaigh ar fhormhór na gcúraimí le feidhmíocht chomhsheasmhach; (3) laghdaítear feabhsuithe ar roinnt modhanna le múnla réamhthraenáilte níos mó; agus (4) is minic go mbíonn gnóthachain ó mhodhanna éagsúla comhlántach agus go bhfeidhmíonn an tsamhail chomhcheangailte is fearr gar do bhunlíne láidir faoi mhaoirseacht iomlán. Foinse oscailte againn ár bhfoireann uirlisí, FewNLU, a chuireann ár gcreat meastóireachta i bhfeidhm mar aon le roinnt modhanna úrscothacha.', 'hu': 'Az utóbbi időben sok figyelmet keltett a természetes nyelvértés (NLU) feladata. A korábbi módszereket azonban különböző jegyzőkönyvek alapján értékelték, ami akadályozza a tisztességes összehasonlítást és a terület előrehaladásának mérését. A probléma megoldása érdekében olyan értékelési keretet vezetünk be, amely három kulcsfontosságú szempontból javítja a korábbi értékelési eljárásokat, azaz a tesztteljesítmény, a fejlesztés-teszt korreláció és a stabilitás. Az új értékelési keretrendszer keretében újraértékelünk több korszerű, néhányszoros módszert az NLU feladatokhoz. Keretrendszerünk új betekintéseket tár fel: (1) a módszerek abszolút teljesítményét és relatív hiányát egyaránt nem becsültük pontosan a korábbi irodalomban; (2) egyetlen módszer sem dominálja a legtöbb olyan feladatot, amely következetes teljesítményt nyújt; (3) egyes módszerek javítása egy nagyobb előképzett modell esetében csökken; és (4) a különböző módszerekből származó nyereségek gyakran kiegészítik egymást, és a legjobb kombinált modell közel teljesít az erős, teljes körűen felügyelt kiindulási értékhez. Nyílt forráskódú eszköztárunkat, a FewNLU-t használjuk, amely számos korszerű módszerrel együtt valósítja meg értékelési keretrendszerünket.', 'el': 'Το έργο κατανόησης φυσικής γλώσσας (NLU) έχει προσελκύσει πολύ πρόσφατη προσοχή. Ωστόσο, οι προηγούμενες μέθοδοι έχουν αξιολογηθεί βάσει ενός διαφορετικού συνόλου πρωτοκόλλων, το οποίο εμποδίζει τη δίκαιη σύγκριση και τη μέτρηση της προόδου του τομέα. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, εισάγουμε ένα πλαίσιο αξιολόγησης που βελτιώνει τις προηγούμενες διαδικασίες αξιολόγησης σε τρεις βασικές πτυχές, δηλαδή την απόδοση των δοκιμών, τη συσχέτιση ανάπτυξης-δοκιμής και τη σταθερότητα. Στο πλαίσιο αυτού του νέου πλαισίου αξιολόγησης, επανεξετάζουμε αρκετές προηγμένες μεθόδους ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών για εργασίες NLU. Το πλαίσιο μας αποκαλύπτει νέες γνώσεις: (1) τόσο η απόλυτη απόδοση όσο και το σχετικό χάσμα των μεθόδων δεν υπολογίστηκαν με ακρίβεια στην προηγούμενη βιβλιογραφία. (2) καμία ενιαία μέθοδος δεν κυριαρχεί στα περισσότερα καθήκοντα με συνεπή απόδοση· (3) οι βελτιώσεις ορισμένων μεθόδων μειώνονται με ένα μεγαλύτερο προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο· και (4) τα κέρδη από διαφορετικές μεθόδους είναι συχνά συμπληρωματικά και το καλύτερο συνδυασμένο μοντέλο αποδίδει κοντά σε μια ισχυρή βάση πλήρους εποπτείας. Ανοίγουμε την εργαλειοθήκη μας, το οποίο εφαρμόζει το πλαίσιο αξιολόγησης μας μαζί με μια σειρά από μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'ka': 'რამდენიმე ნაირადი ენერგიის გაგრძნობა (NLU) რაოდენობა უფრო ახალგაზრულად აღმოჩენა. მაგრამ, პროტოკოლობის განსხვავებული ნაწილის შემდეგ წინასწარმოდგენა პროტოკოლობის შემდეგ, რომელიც ძალიან გადამწყვეტილება და განზომილება პანელის პროგრესი. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ განსაზღვრებული ფრამეტრი, რომელიც წინასწორედ განსაზღვრებული პრობლემეტრებში სამნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვრებული პრობლემეტრებში, მა ამ ახალი განსაზღვრების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენ განაზღვრებით ნელს სამუშაო დავალებებისთვის რამდენიმე სამუშაო განსაზღვრება. ჩვენი პარამეტრი აღმოჩნდა ახალი შესახებ: (1) ყველაფერი აბსოლუტური გამოსახულება და რედაციალური განსხვავება პროცემეტს არ იყო წინასწინასწინასწინასწინას (2) არ არის ერთი მეტი, რომელიც უფრო დიომინტირებს უფრო მეტად კონსტენტური მუშაობებით; (3) ზოგიერთი მეცედომების უფრო მეტირები უფრო მეტირებული მოდელთან გაზრუნდება; და (4) განსხვავებული მეტოვებისგან მოიღება ზოგიერთად კომპლემენტურია, და ყველაზე უკეთესი კომპლემენტურია მოდელი გავაკეთება ძალიან დარწმუნებული ფეს ჩვენ ჩვენი ხელსაწყოთა კიტი, FewNLU, რომელიც ჩვენი განსაზღვრების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციას გავამყენებთ, რამდენიმე ხელსაწყოთა მეტი', 'it': "Il compito di comprensione del linguaggio naturale (NLU) ha attirato molta attenzione recente. Tuttavia, i metodi precedenti sono stati valutati nell'ambito di una serie eterogenea di protocolli, il che ostacola un confronto equo e una misurazione dei progressi del settore. Per affrontare questo problema, introduciamo un framework di valutazione che migliora le precedenti procedure di valutazione in tre aspetti chiave, vale a dire, le prestazioni dei test, la correlazione dev-test e la stabilità. Nell'ambito di questo nuovo quadro di valutazione, rivalutamo diversi metodi all'avanguardia per le attività NLU. Il nostro framework rivela nuove intuizioni: (1) sia la performance assoluta che il gap relativo dei metodi non sono stati accuratamente stimati in letteratura precedente; (2) nessun metodo domina la maggior parte dei compiti con prestazioni coerenti; (3) i miglioramenti di alcuni metodi diminuiscono con un modello pretrained più ampio; e (4) i vantaggi derivanti da diversi metodi sono spesso complementari e il modello combinato migliore si avvicina a una base di riferimento forte e pienamente supervisionata. Abbiamo aperto il nostro toolkit, FewNLU, che implementa il nostro framework di valutazione insieme a una serie di metodi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Neseniai daug dėmesio buvo skiriama nedideliam natūralaus kalbų supratimo uždaviniui. However, prior methods have been evaluated under a disparate set of protocols, which hinders fair comparison and measuring the progress of the field.  To address this issue, we introduce an evaluation framework that improves previous evaluation procedures in three key aspects, i.e., test performance, dev-test correlation, and stability.  Pagal šią naują vertinimo sistemą iš naujo vertiname keletą naujausių kelių NLU užduočių metodų. Mūsų sistema atskleidžia naujas žinias: 1) anksčiau literatūroje nebuvo tiksliai įvertintas absoliutus metodų veiksmingumas ir santykinis skirtumas; (2) dauguma užduočių, kurių rezultatai nuoseklūs, dominuoja nė vienas metodas; (3) kai kurių metodų patobulinimas mažėja taikant didesnį išankstinio mokymo model į; ir (4) nauda, gauta taikant skirtingus metodus, dažnai papildo vieną kitą, o geriausias kombinuotas modelis veikia beveik visiškai prižiūrint bazinius rodiklius. Mes atviras mūsų priemonių rinkinys, FewNLU, kuris įgyvendina mūsų vertinimo sistemą kartu su keletu naujausių metodų.', 'kk': 'Кейбір табиғи тілді түсінім (НLU) тапсырмасы жаңа тәртіпке қарады. Бірақ алдыңғы әдістер өзгертілген протоколдар жиынында бағалады, бұл өрісінің жағдайды салыстыру мен өлшемін бұғаттайды. Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін біз алдыңғы оқу процедурлерін үш негізгі аспектерінде жақсы жасайтын оқу бағдарламасын келтіреміз, мысалы, сынақтар істеуі, тескерту корелациясы және стабилі Бұл жаңа бағалау бағдарламасында NLU тапсырмаларының бірнеше күй- жайындағы күй- жайындағы бағалау әдістерін қайта бағалаймыз. Біздің қоршауымыз жаңа түсініктерді көрсетеді: (1) әдістердің абсолютті істеу мен қатынастық қашықтығы алдыңғы литературада дұрыс бағаламады. (2) бір әдіс тапсырмалардың көпшілігін тұрақты істеу үшін көпшілігін басталмайды; (2) (3) Кейбір әдістердің жақсартулары үлкен өзгертілген үлгілер үлгісімен азайтады; және (4) әртүрлі әдістерден жетістіктері көбінесе біріктірілген және ең жақсы біріктірілген үлгі біріктірілген негізгі сызыққа жақын жұмыс істейді. Біз құралдарымызды ашып, FewNLU бағалау бағдарламаларымызды бірнеше әртүрлі әдістерімен бірге орындайды.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ട് (NLU) ജോലി ഏറ്റവും അടുത്തുതന്നെ ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും മുമ്പ് രീതികള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു പ്രോട്ടോക്കോളുകളുടെ കീഴില്\u200d വിലയിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് നീതിയായി തുല്യമാ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് നോക്കാന്\u200d, മുമ്പുള്ള വിലാസപ്രക്രിയകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്ന ഒരു വിലാസപ്രക്രിയയെ മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. മൂന്നു പ്രധാ ഈ പുതിയ വിലാസപ്രകൃതിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d നിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി കുറച്ച് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സ്റ്റ നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമേക്ക് പുതിയ കണ്ണുകള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു: (1) രീതികളുടെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വ്യത്യാസവും  (2) ഒരേയൊരു രീതിയില്ല, ഒരുപാട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് മിക്കവേറെ ജോലികളെ മേല്\u200dനോട്ടം നട (3) ചില രീതികളുടെ മുന്നറിയിപ്പുകള്\u200d കുറച്ച് വലിയ മോഡലില്\u200d കുറവ് വരുത്തുന്നു; (4) വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സമ്പാദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും കൂടുതല്\u200d സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായിരിക്കുന ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d തുറക്കുന്നത് ഫ്യൂന്\u200dഎല്യൂ, അത് നമ്മുടെ വിലാസപ്രകൃതിയെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് രാജ്യത്', 'mk': 'Разбирањето на природниот јазик (НЛУ) привлече многу неодамнешно внимание. Сепак, претходните методи се проценети под различни протоколи, кои го попречуваат фер споредба и мерење на напредокот на полето. To address this issue, we introduce an evaluation framework that improves previous evaluation procedures in three key aspects, i.e., test performance, dev-test correlation, and stability.  Според оваа нова рамка за проценка, повторно ги проценуваме неколку најсовремени методи за задачите на НЛУ. Нашата рамка открива нови информации: (1) како апсолутната резултатност, така и релативната празнина на методите не се прецизно проценети во претходната литература; . (2) ниту еден метод не доминира во повеќето задачи со константна извршност; . (3) подобрувањата на некои методи се намалуваат со поголем предобучен модел; и (4) добивките од различни методи честопати се комплементарни и најдобриот комбиниран модел функционира блиску до силна целосно надгледувана основа. Ние го отвораме нашиот набор на алатки, FewNLU, кој ја имплементира нашата рамка за проценка заедно со голем број најсовремени методи.', 'ms': 'Tugas pemahaman bahasa biasa (NLU) telah menarik perhatian baru-baru ini. Namun, kaedah terdahulu telah diuji dibawah set protokol yang berbeza, yang menghalangi perbandingan yang adil dan mengukur kemajuan medan. Untuk mengatasi isu in i, kami memperkenalkan kerangka penilaian yang memperbaiki prosedur penilaian terdahulu dalam tiga aspek utama, iaitu prestasi ujian, korelasi dev-test, dan kestabilan. Dalam kerangka penilaian baru ini, kami mengevaluasi semula beberapa kaedah terbaik untuk tugas NLU. kerangka kami mengungkapkan pandangan baru: (1) kedua-dua prestasi mutlak dan jarak relatif kaedah tidak dijangka dengan tepat dalam literatur terdahulu; . (2) tiada kaedah tunggal mengawal kebanyakan tugas dengan prestasi konsisten; - (3) peningkatan beberapa kaedah berkurang dengan model yang lebih besar yang dilatih; and (4) gains from different methods are often complementary and the best combined model performs close to a strong fully-supervised baseline.  Kami membuka sumber alat kami, FewNLU, yang melaksanakan kerangka penilaian kami bersama dengan beberapa kaedah terbaik.', 'mt': 'Il-kompitu tal-fehim naturali tal-lingwi (NLU) b’ftit skopijiet attira ħafna attenzjoni reċenti. Madankollu, metodi preċedenti ġew evalwati taħt sett differenti ta’ protokolli, li jfixklu tqabbil ġust u kejl tal-progress tal-qasam. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nintroduċu qafas ta’ evalwazzjoni li jtejjeb il-proċeduri ta’ evalwazzjoni preċedenti fi tliet aspetti ewlenin, jiġifieri l-prestazzjoni tat-test, il-korrelazzjoni dev-test, u l-istabbiltà. Taħt dan il-qafas ġdid ta’ evalwazzjoni, aħna nivvalutaw mill-ġdid diversi metodi ta’ ftit skopijiet avvanzati għall-kompiti tal-NLU. Il-qafas tagħna jiżvela fehmiet ġodda: (1) kemm il-prestazzjoni assoluta kif ukoll id-diskrepanza relattiva tal-metodi ma ġewx stmati b’mod preċiż fil-letteratura preċedenti; (2) no single method dominates most tasks with consistent performance;   (3) it-titjib ta’ xi metodi jonqos b’mudell akbar mħarreġ minn qabel; u (4) il-qligħ minn metodi differenti ħafna drabi huwa kumplimentari u l-a ħjar mudell ikkombinat iwettaq prestazzjoni qrib linja bażi b’saħħitha sorveljata bis-sħiħ. Aħna noftħu s-sett ta’ għodod tagħna, FewNLU, li jimplimenta l-qafas ta’ evalwazzjoni tagħna flimkien ma’ għadd ta’ metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл ойлголт (НLU) нь саяхан анхаарал татсан. Гэхдээ өмнөх арга нь хуваагдах протоколууд доор дүүрэн харьцуулах болон талбарын хөгжлийг хэмжих зорилготой. Энэ асуудлыг асуухын тулд бид өмнөх оюутнуудын процедурыг гурван чухал талаар сайжруулдаг оюутнуудын системийг танилцуулдаг. Яг л шалгалтын үйл ажиллагаа, хөгжлийн тест холбоотой болон тогтвортой. Энэ шинэ дүгнэлтийн хэмжээнд бид NLU ажлын хэдэн төрлийн урлагийн хэмжээний аргыг дахин дүгнэж байна. Бидний хувьд шинэ ойлголт илэрхийлдэг: (1) арга замын бүрэн үйл ажиллагаа болон харьцангуй ялгаа өмнө нь уран зохиолд тодорхойлж чадахгүй байсан. (2) Ер нэг арга нь ихэнх үйл ажиллагаанд давамгайлагддаггүй. (3) Зарим арга загварын сайжруулалтыг илүү том загвартай багасгаж, (4) өөр арга замын ашиг ихэвчлэн нэмэгдүүлдэг ба хамгийн сайн нийлүүлсэн загвар нь хүчтэй бүрэн удирдлагатай суурь шугам хүртэл ажилладаг. Бид маш олон урлагийн төлөвлөгөөтэй хамтран үнэлгээний системийг ашиглаж, FewNLU-г нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй.', 'pl': 'W ostatnim czasie zadanie zrozumienia języka naturalnego (NLU) przyciągnęło wiele uwagi. Jednakże wcześniejsze metody oceniano w oparciu o różny zestaw protokołów, co utrudnia uczciwe porównanie i pomiar postępu w tej dziedzinie. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, wprowadzamy ramy oceny, które usprawniają poprzednie procedury oceny w trzech kluczowych aspektach, tj. wydajność testu, korelację dev-test i stabilność. W ramach tych nowych ram oceny dokonujemy ponownej oceny kilku najnowocześniejszych metod kilku ujęć dla zadań NLU. Nasze ramy ujawniają nowe spostrzeżenia: (1) zarówno bezwzględna wydajność, jak i względna luka metod nie zostały dokładnie oszacowane w poprzedniej literaturze; (2) żadna pojedyncza metoda nie dominuje w większości zadań ze spójną wydajnością; (3) ulepszenia niektórych metod zmniejszają się wraz z większym modelem wstępnie trenowanym; oraz (4) korzyści z różnych metod są często uzupełniające, a najlepszy połączony model działa blisko silnej bazy podstawowej pod pełnym nadzorem. Otwarty jest zestaw narzędzi FewNLU, który wdraża nasze ramy oceny wraz z szeregiem najnowocześniejszych metod.', 'ro': 'Sarcina de înțelegere a limbajului natural (NLU) a atras multă atenție recentă. Cu toate acestea, metodele anterioare au fost evaluate în baza unui set diferit de protocoale, ceea ce împiedică compararea echitabilă și măsurarea progresului în domeniu. Pentru a aborda această problemă, introducem un cadru de evaluare care îmbunătățește procedurile de evaluare anterioare în trei aspecte cheie, și anume performanța testului, corelația test-dev și stabilitatea. În cadrul acestui nou cadru de evaluare, reevaluăm mai multe metode de ultimă oră pentru sarcinile NLU. Cadrul nostru dezvăluie noi perspective: (1) atât performanța absolută, cât și decalajul relativ al metodelor nu au fost estimate cu exactitate în literatura de specialitate anterioară; (2) nicio metodă unică nu domină majoritatea sarcinilor cu performanțe consecvente; (3) îmbunătățirile unor metode diminuează odată cu un model mai larg pregătit; și (4) câștigurile obținute de diferite metode sunt adesea complementare, iar cel mai bun model combinat are performanțe aproape de o bază puternică, supravegheată pe deplin. Setul nostru de instrumente cu sursă deschisă, FewNLU, implementează cadrul nostru de evaluare împreună cu o serie de metode de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Prirodno razumijevanje jezika (NLU) koji je snimljen je privlačio mnogo nedavne pažnje. Međutim, prethodne metode su procjenjene pod različitim setom protokola, koji sprječava fer usporedbu i mjerenje napreda polja. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predstavljamo okvir za procjenu koji poboljšava prethodne procjene u tri ključna aspekta, tj. provedbu testova, korelaciju razvoja testova i stabilnost. Prema ovom novom okviru procjene, ponovno procjenjujemo nekoliko metoda države umjetnosti za NLU zadataka. Naš okvir otkriva nove uvjete: (1) i apsolutna funkcija i relativna praznina metoda nisu precizno procenila u prethodnoj literaturi; (2) nijedan jedini metod ne dominira većinu zadataka sa konsekvencijom funkcije; (3) poboljšanja nekih metoda smanjuje se sa većim obrezanim modelom; i (4) dobiti od različitih metoda često su komplementni, a najbolji kombinirani model izvodi blizu jake potpuno nadzirene osnovne linije. Otvoreni izvorimo naš toolkit, FewNLU, koji implementira naš okvir za procjenu zajedno sa mnogim metodama države umjetnosti.', 'no': 'Det få bilete naturspråksforståkinga (NLU) har attrakta mykje nyleg oppmerksomhet. Førre metodar er imidlertid evaluert under eit ulike set av protokollar, som hindrar rett sammenlikning og målar framgang i feltet. For å handtera dette problemet introdusere vi eit evalueringsrammeverk som forbedrar tidlegare evalueringsprosedyrar i tre nøkkelaspektar, t.d. testutviklinga, dev-test-korrelasjon og stabilitet. Under denne nye evalueringsrammeverket evaluerer vi fleire metodar for NLU-oppgåver på nytt. Rammeverket vårt viser nye opplysningar: (1) både absolutte utvikling og relative avstanden av metodane var ikkje nøyaktig anslått i førre literatur. (2) ingen enkelt metode dominerer dei fleste oppgåver med konsistent utvikling; (3) forbetringar av nokre metodar minkar med ein større modell som er kryssa av. og (4) gjennomgang frå ulike metodar er ofte komplementar, og den beste kombinasjonen modellen utfører nær ein sterk fullstendig oversikt baseline. Vi opna kjelde vår verktøykassett, FewNLU, som implementerer vårt evalueringsrammeverket saman med mange metodar for kunsten.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka afka dabiicadda ah (NLU) waxyaabaha loo yaqaan waxay soo jeeday taxadar badan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa lagu qiimeeyay qaababka hore oo ka hoosaysa qoraalo kala duduwan, taas oo ka hor jeediya isbardhigidda caddaalad ah iyo qiyaastiisa horumarinta duurka. Si aan arrintan ula hadlo, waxaan soo bandhignaynaa firaaqada qiimeynta e e horumarinta ah saddexda dhinac oo muhiimka ah, tusaale ahaan sameynta imtixaanka, xiriirka baaritaanka iyo stabilnaanta. Qoraalkan cusub ee qiimeynta, waxaynu mar kale qiimeynaynaa noocyo badan oo dowlad-farshaxan ah oo u dhow qaabab lagu sameeyo shaqada NLU. Qoraalkayaga ayaa muujiya aragtida cusub: (1) dhamaantooda dhamaantooda iyo qeybta saaxiibka ah ee qaababka aan si sax ah loo qiimeyn qoraalka hore; (2) Qasab keliya oo maamula shaqada aad u badan oo ku shaqeeya sameynta; (3) Horumarinta qaababka qaarkood waxay ku yaraadaan tusaale aad u weyn oo hore; (4) waxyaabaha laga helaa qaabooyin kala duduwan waa kuwa ku adag, waxaana sameynaya qaababka ugu wanaagsan oo ku dhow qoraalka hoose oo aad u ilaalisan. Waxaynu furan nahay qalabka qalabka, FewNLU, kaas oo sameeya qashinkeenna qiimeynta iyo qaabab badan oo dowlad-farshaxan ah.', 'sv': 'Uppgiften om naturlig språkförståelse (NLU) har väckt mycket uppmärksamhet på senare tid. Tidigare metoder har dock utvärderats enligt olika protokoll, vilket hindrar rättvis jämförelse och mätning av framstegen inom området. För att ta itu med denna fråga introducerar vi ett utvärderingsram som förbättrar tidigare utvärderingsförfaranden i tre viktiga aspekter, dvs. testprestanda, utveckling-test korrelation och stabilitet. Inom ramen för denna nya utvärderingsram omvärderar vi flera toppmoderna metoder för NLU-uppgifter. Vårt ramverk avslöjar nya insikter: (1) både den absoluta prestandan och den relativa klyftan i metoderna uppskattades inte korrekt i tidigare litteratur; (2) Ingen enda metod dominerar de flesta uppgifter med konsekvent prestanda. (3) Förbättringar av vissa metoder minskar med en större förkränad modell. och (4) Vinsterna från olika metoder kompletterar ofta varandra och den bästa kombinerade modellen presterar nära en stark, fullt övervakad baslinje. Vi använder vår verktygslåda med öppen källkod, FewNLU, som implementerar vårt utvärderingsram tillsammans med ett antal toppmoderna metoder.', 'ta': 'சில சுட்டிக்கப்பட்ட இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து (NLU) செயல் சமீபத்தில் கவனத்தை பெருக்கினார். ஆனால், முன்னோர் முறைகள் ஒரு வேறுபட்ட நெறிமுறைகளின் கீழ் மதிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது நீதமான ஒப்பீடு மற்றும் புலத்தின் முன்னேற To address this issue, we introduce an evaluation framework that improves previous evaluation procedures in three key aspects, i.e., test performance, dev-test correlation, and stability.  இந்த புதிய ஆய்வு சட்டத்திற்கு கீழே நாம் NLU பணிகளுக்கு பல நிலையை மீண்டும் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் புதிய குறிப்புகளை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறது: (1) முறைமைகளின் முழுமையான செயல்பாடு மற்றும் சார்ந்த இடைவெளியில்  (2) பொதுவான செயல்பாட்டுடன் பெரும்பாலான செயல்களை கட்டுப்படுத்துவதில்லை; (3) சில முன்னேற்றங்களின் முன்னேற்றங்கள் பெரிய மாதிரியினால் குறைகிறது; (4) வேறு முறைகளிலிருந்து வெற்றி பெறுவது பெரும்பாலும் சிறப்பான இணைப்பு மாதிரி செயல்படுகிறது வலிமை முழு கண்காணிக நாங்கள் எங்கள் கருவிப்பாடுக்குறிப்பை திறந்து விடுகிறோம், FewNLU, அது எங்கள் மதிப்பிப்பு சட்டத்தை செயல்படுத்துகிறது சில', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම (NLU) කාර්යයෙන් ගොඩක් අලුත් අවධානය අල්ලගත්තා. නමුත්, මුලින් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාලය සඳහා වෙනස් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒකෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා මුලින් විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස මේ අළුත් විශ්ලේෂණ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයට, අපි NLU වැඩ කරන විදියට කිහිපයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය අලුත් අදහස් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා: (1) පරීක්ෂණයේ සම්පූර්ණය සහ සම්පූර්ණයාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිකාශයක් ප්\u200dරතිකා (2) කිසිම විධානයක් නැති විධානයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය සඳහා ගොඩක් වැඩක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා (3) කිසිම විද්\u200dයාවක් වැඩි විද්\u200dයාසයක් වැඩි ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ඩ් මොඩල් එක්ක අඩු වෙනවා; (4) වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණයි. හොඳම සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා. අපි අපේ උපකරණ කිත, FewNLU, අපේ විශ්ලේෂණ ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගයක් සමග සංඛ්යාත්මක විධානය කරන්නේ.', 'ur': 'تھوڑے شاٹ کی طبیعی زبان سمجھنے والے (NLU) کام نے بہت اچھی توجه کی ہے۔ لیکن پہلے کی طریقے ایک مختلف پروٹروکولوں کے سٹے کے ذریعے مطالبہ کئے گئے ہیں، جو انصاف مقایسہ کرنے سے روکتے ہیں اور کھیتی کی پیشرفت کا اندازہ کئے جاتے ہیں. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک ارزیابی فرم کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو پہلے کی ارزیابی پردازشیوں کو تین کلی аспектوں میں بہتر کرتا ہے، یعنی آزمائش کی عملکرد، ڈولٹ-آزمائش کی ارتباط، اور ثابت قدم. یہ نئی ارتفاع فرمیک کے اندر ہم NLU کے کاموں کے لئے چند ایٹیٹ کی کم شوٹ طریقے دوبارہ ارتفاع کریں گے۔ ہمارا فرمود نئی نظریں ظاہر کرتا ہے: (1) ان طریقوں کی مطلوب عملکرد اور نسبت تفاوت پہلے کی کتاب میں مطلوب مقرر نہیں کی گئی۔ (2) کوئی طریقہ نہیں ہے کہ اکثر کاموں کو ثابت قدم سے غالب کرتا ہے۔ (3) بعض طریقوں کی تغییرات بہت زیادہ زیادہ آرام کی مدل سے کم ہوتی ہیں۔ اور (4) مختلف طریقے سے فائدہ اضافہ کرنے والی ہے اور بہترین ترکیب مدل ایک مضبوط پوری نظارت کی بنسٹلین کے نزدیک عمل کرتا ہے۔ ہم اپنے تولیک کیٹ، FewNLU، کھولتے ہیں، جو ہمارے ارزیابی فرمود کے ساتھ بہت سی موجود طریقوں کے ساتھ چلتا ہے.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik asosiy tilni tushunish (NLU) vazifasi eng yaqinda ko'p paydo qiladi. Lekin oldin usullar ajratilgan protokollar davomida qiymat qilindi, bu soniyatning tajribasini aniqlash va taʼminlov qiladi. Bu muammo bilan murojaat qilish uchun biz oldingi qiymatning vazifalarini uchta muhim darajada bajariladigan qiymatni o'zgartirib chiqaramiz, balki sinov bajarish, dev-test bog'liq, va stabiliyat. Bu yangi qiymatni qanday qilib, biz NLU vazifalari uchun bir necha marta-saqlash usullarini qayta qiymatmiz. Freymizning yangi ko'rini ko'rsatadi: (1) usullarning hamma ishlatish va qisqarli gap o'zgarishlar oldin litteratasiga tayyorlanmagan emas. (2) Hech qanday usul bir xil vazifalarni butunlay bajarish uchun boshqaruvchi emas; (3) Bir necha usullarning o'zgarishlarini katta taqdim qilish modeli bilan kamaytirish; va boshqa usullardan foydalanuvchilar ko'pincha murakkablar va eng yaxshi bir qanday bir bir bir bir xil model boshqaruvchi asboblar bilan bajaradi. We open-source our toolkit, FewNLU, that implements our evaluation framework along with a number of state-of-the-art methods.", 'vi': 'Công việc hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (Ntrường hợp) đã thu hút nhiều sự chú ý gần đây. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp trước đã được đánh giá dựa trên một loạt các giao thức khác nhau, nó cản trở sự so sánh công bằng và đo lường tiến trình của lĩnh vực. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi sẽ tạo ra một khung đánh giá cải thiện các thủ tục đánh giá trước đây trong ba khía cạnh chủ chốt, gồm: khả năng kiểm tra, mối tương quan. Với bộ phận đánh giá mới này, chúng tôi tái đánh giá lại các phương pháp hiếm hoi nhất trong các nhiệm vụ Ntrường. Hệ thống của chúng tôi tiết lộ những nhận thức mới: 1) cả khả năng tuyệt đối và khoảng cách tương đối của các phương pháp không được đánh giá chính xác trong văn học trước, (2) không có phương pháp đơn giản nào đè bẹp hầu hết các nhiệm vụ có hiệu quả nhất; (3) Sự cải tiến của một số phương pháp giảm dần với một mô hình lớn. và (4) lợi nhuận từ các phương pháp khác nhau thường là bổ sung, và mô hình kết hợp tốt nhất đạt được gần với một cơ sở cơ bản được giám sát đầy đủ. Chúng tôi mở nguồn đầy đủ đồ nghề của chúng tôi, FedwNlu, thứ thực hiện hệ thống đánh giá của chúng tôi cùng với một số phương pháp hiện đại.', 'nl': 'De weinige-shot natuurlijke taal begrijpen (NLU) taak heeft veel recente aandacht getrokken. Eerdere methoden zijn echter geëvalueerd op basis van verschillende protocollen, wat een eerlijke vergelijking en het meten van de vooruitgang van het veld belemmert. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, introduceren we een evaluatiekader dat eerdere evaluatieprocedures verbetert in drie belangrijke aspecten, namelijk testprestaties, dev-test correlatie en stabiliteit. In dit nieuwe evaluatiekader evalueren we verschillende state-of-the-art few-shot methodes voor NLU-taken. Ons raamwerk onthult nieuwe inzichten: (1) zowel de absolute prestaties als de relatieve kloof van de methoden werden niet nauwkeurig geschat in eerdere literatuur; (2) geen enkele methode domineert de meeste taken met consistente prestaties; (3) verbeteringen van sommige methoden nemen af met een groter voorgetraind model; en (4) de voordelen van verschillende methoden zijn vaak complementair en het beste gecombineerde model presteert dicht bij een sterke, volledig onder toezicht staande baseline. We openen onze toolkit FewNLU, die ons evaluatiekader implementeert, samen met een aantal state-of-the-art methoden.', 'bg': 'Задачата за разбиране на естествения език (НЛУ) привлича много внимание в последно време. Предишните методи обаче са оценени по различен набор от протоколи, което пречи на справедливото сравнение и измерване на напредъка на терена. За да се справим с този проблем, въвеждаме рамка за оценка, която подобрява предишните процедури за оценка в три ключови аспекта, т.е. производителност на теста, корелация разработка-тест и стабилност. Съгласно тази нова рамка за оценка ние преоценяваме няколко най-съвременни метода с няколко изстрела за задачите на НЛУ. Нашата рамка разкрива нови прозрения: (1) както абсолютното представяне, така и относителната пропаст на методите не са точно оценени в предишната литература; (2) нито един метод не доминира в повечето задачи с последователно изпълнение; (3) подобренията на някои методи намаляват с по-голям предварително трениран модел; и (4) печалбите от различни методи често се допълват и най-добрият комбиниран модел се представя близо до силна напълно контролирана базова база. Ние използваме нашия инструментариум с отворен код, който прилага нашата рамка за оценка заедно с редица най-съвременни методи.', 'da': 'Opgaven med naturlig sprogforståelse (NLU) har for nylig tiltrukket meget opmærksomhed. Tidligere metoder er imidlertid blevet evalueret i henhold til forskellige protokoller, hvilket hindrer fair sammenligning og måling af fremskridt på området. For at løse dette problem indfører vi en evalueringsramme, der forbedrer tidligere evalueringsprocedurer i tre centrale aspekter, dvs. testydelse, udviklings-test korrelation og stabilitet. Under denne nye evalueringsramme revurderer vi flere state-of-the-art metoder til NLU-opgaver. Vores ramme afslører nye indsigter: (1) både metodernes absolutte performance og relative kløft blev ikke nøjagtigt estimeret i tidligere litteratur; (2) ingen enkelt metode dominerer de fleste opgaver med ensartet ydeevne (3) forbedringer af visse metoder mindskes med en større prætrænet model; og (4) gevinster fra forskellige metoder er ofte komplementære, og den bedste kombinerede model fungerer tæt på en stærk, fuldt overvåget baseline. Vi open source vores værktøjssæt, FewNLU, der implementerer vores evalueringsramme sammen med en række state-of-the-art metoder.', 'hr': 'Prirodno razumijevanje prirodnog jezika (NLU) zadatak je privukao mnogo nedavne pažnje. Međutim, prethodne metode su procijenjene u skladu s različitim skupom protokola, koji sprječava fer usporedbu i mjerenje napreda polja. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predstavljamo okvir za procjenu koji poboljšava prethodne procjene u tri ključna aspekta, tj. provedbu ispitivanja, korelaciju ispitivanja i stabilnost. U okviru ovog novog okvira procjene, ponovno procjenjujemo nekoliko metoda države umjetnosti za NLU zadatke. Naš okvir otkriva nove uvide: (1) i apsolutna djelovanja i relativna praznina metoda nisu precizno procijenjena u prethodnoj literaturi; (2) nijedan jedini metod ne dominaira većinu zadataka s konsekvencijom učinkovitosti; (3) poboljšanja nekih metoda smanjuje se s većim obrazovanim modelom; i (4) dobiti od različitih metoda često su komplementni, a najbolji kombinirani model izvodi blizu jake potpuno nadzirene početne linije. Otvoreni izvorimo naš toolkit, FewNLU, koji implementira naš okvir za procjenu zajedno s brojem nacionalnih metoda umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Die seltene Aufgabe des Verständnisses natürlicher Sprache (NLU) hat in letzter Zeit viel Aufmerksamkeit erregt. Bisherige Methoden wurden jedoch mit unterschiedlichen Protokollen bewertet, was einen fairen Vergleich und eine Messung des Fortschritts des Feldes erschwert. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, führen wir ein Evaluationsframework ein, das bisherige Evaluationsverfahren in drei Schlüsselaspekten verbessert: Testleistung, Entwicklungs-Test-Korrelation und Stabilität. Im Rahmen dieses neuen Evaluierungsrahmens evaluieren wir mehrere State-of-the-Art Few-Shot-Methoden für NLU-Aufgaben neu. Unser Framework zeigt neue Erkenntnisse: (1) Sowohl die absolute Leistung als auch die relative Lücke der Methoden wurden in der bisherigen Literatur nicht genau abgeschätzt; (2) keine einzige Methode dominiert die meisten Aufgaben mit gleichbleibender Leistung; (3) Verbesserungen einiger Methoden nehmen mit einem größeren vortrainierten Modell ab; und (4) Gewinne aus verschiedenen Methoden ergänzen sich oft und das beste kombinierte Modell schneidet nahe einer starken vollständig überwachten Basislinie ab. Wir öffnen unser Toolkit FewNLU, das unser Evaluationsframework zusammen mit einer Reihe von State-of-the-Art Methoden implementiert.', 'sw': 'Maelezo ya lugha ya asili (NLU) yalivutia hisia za hivi karibuni. Hata hivyo, mbinu za kabla zimekuwa za kuchapishwa chini ya mfululizo wa mipango tofauti, ambazo zinazuia kulinganisha haki na kupima maendeleo ya uwanja. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunaonyesha mfumo wa uchunguzi unaotengeneza mchakato wa tatu wa uchunguzi uliopita katika vipengele vitatu, yaani utendaji wa jaribio, uhusiano wa uchunguzi, na ustawi. Katika mfumo huu mpya wa uchunguzi, tunapitia tena mbinu kadhaa za hali ya sanaa za kazi za NLU. Mifumo yetu inaonyesha mitazamo mapya: (1) utendaji wa kamili na upande wa karibu wa njia hizo hazikukadiriwa sahihi katika fasihi za kabla; (2) Hakuna njia moja inayotawala kazi nyingi kwa ufanisi mkubwa; (3) Maboresho ya baadhi ya njia zinapungua kwa mtindo mkubwa uliotarajiwa; na kupata mafanikio kutoka kwa njia tofauti mara nyingi ni ya uungwaji na mifano bora zaidi inafanya karibu na msingi uliothibitiwa kwa nguvu. We open-source our toolkit, FewNLU, that implements our evaluation framework along with a number of state-of-the-art methods.', 'ko': '자연 언어 이해(NLU) 임무가 최근 폭넓은 관심을 끌고 있다.그러나 이전의 방법은 완전히 다른 협의 아래 평가를 하였는데, 이것은 이 분야의 공평한 비교와 평가를 방해하였다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 평가 프레임워크를 도입했다. 이 프레임워크는 세 가지 관건적인 측면에서 이전의 평가 과정, 즉 테스트 성능, 개발 테스트의 관련성과 안정성을 개선했다.이 새로운 평가 틀에서, 우리는 몇 가지 가장 선진적인 NLU 임무 소렌즈 방법을 재평가했다.우리의 구조는 새로운 견해를 제시했다. (1) 이전의 문헌에서 이러한 방법의 절대적인 성능과 상대적인 차이는 정확하게 추정되지 않았다.(2) 대부분의 성능이 일치하는 임무를 주도할 수 있는 방법은 없다.(3) 일부 방법의 개선은 예비 훈련 모델의 증가에 따라 감소한다.(4) 서로 다른 방법의 수익은 일반적으로 서로 보완되고 가장 좋은 조합 모델의 성능은 강력한 완전 감독 기선에 가깝다.우리는 우리의 도구 패키지인 FewNLU를 개발했다. 이것은 우리의 평가 구조와 가장 선진적인 방법을 실현했다.', 'id': 'Tugas pemahaman bahasa alam (NLU) yang sedikit ditembak telah menarik perhatian yang baru-baru ini. Namun, metode sebelumnya telah dievaluasi di bawah set protokol yang berbeda, yang menghalangi perbandingan yang adil dan mengukur kemajuan lapangan. Untuk mengatasi masalah in i, kami memperkenalkan cadangan evaluasi yang memperbaiki prosedur evaluasi sebelumnya dalam tiga aspek kunci, yaitu prestasi tes, korelasi dev-test, dan stabilitas. Di bawah cadangan evaluasi baru ini, kami mengevaluasi kembali beberapa metode terbaik untuk tugas NLU. Bingkai-bingkai kami mengungkapkan pandangan baru: (1) kedua prestasi mutlak dan ruang relatif dari metode tidak diperkirakan dengan tepat dalam literatur sebelumnya; . (2) tidak ada metode tunggal yang mendominasi kebanyakan tugas dengan prestasi konsisten; (3) peningkatan beberapa metode menurun dengan model yang lebih besar yang dilatih; dan (4) keuntungan dari metode yang berbeda sering komplementari dan model kombinasi terbaik berhasil dekat dengan dasar yang kuat yang diawasi sepenuhnya. We open-source our toolkit, FewNLU, that implements our evaluation framework along with a number of state-of-the-art methods.', 'fa': 'وظیفه\u200cی تعلیم زبان طبیعی (NLU) خیلی اخیراً توجه بسیار اخیر را جذب کرده است. ولی روش قبلی تحت مجموعه\u200cی پروتکل\u200cهای مختلف ارزیابی شده\u200cاند، که به مقایسه\u200cی منصفانه و اندازه\u200cگیری پیشرفت زمینه\u200cها جلوگیری می\u200cکند. برای حل این مسئله، ما یک چهارچوب ارزیابی را معرفی می کنیم که پروژه ارزیابی قبلی را در سه منطقه کلید، یعنی انجام آزمایش، ارتباط آزمایش و استواری را بهتر می کند. تحت این چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار NLU را دوباره ارزیابی می کنیم. چهارچوب ما مشاهده\u200cهای جدید را نشان می\u200cدهد: (۱) هر دو اجرای کامل و فاصله نسبتی از روش\u200cها در ادبیات قبل دقیقا تخمین نکرده\u200cاند. (۲) هیچ روش تک بر بیشترین وظیفه\u200cها با عملکرد پایدار نیست. (۳) بهترین برخی از روش\u200cها با یک مدل پیش\u200cفرض بزرگ کاهش می\u200cکند. و (۴) پیروزی از روش\u200cهای مختلف اغلب اضافه می\u200cکنند و بهترین مدل متصل نزدیک یک خط پایین\u200cشناسی بسیار توانا انجام می\u200cدهد. ما کات ابزارهای خود را باز می کنیم، FewNLU که چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها', 'tr': 'NLU(iň kiçi görnüş) täze diller düşünmesi ýakyn düşünmesi oňky üns çekdi. Ýöne öňki metodlar üýtgeşik bir protokolyň astynda deňlendirildi. Bu ýerde adalat karşılaştyrmagy we önderlemesini engelleýär. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, öňki deňlenme prosedürlerini üç wajyp aspektlerde geliştiren çözümleme çerçevesini tapdyryp görkezip, mysal çözgüt, gelişmek bilen düşürmek we stabilitete diýipdir. Bu täze değerlendirme çerçevesinde, NLU görevleri üçin birnäçe durumda-sanat küçük resim täzelikleri değerlendirip bileris. Biziň çerýämiz täze düşünjeleri şöňürýär: (1) ýöne mekdepleriň absolut eserlerini we relative gaplaryny öňki edebiýatda dogry deňlendirmedildi; (1) (2) Hiç hili ýeke täze täze işiň köp zadyny daşary edip bilmeýär; - Name (3) Bazı metodların gelişmeleri büyük bir önlenmiş modeli ile azaltır; (4) Farklı yönlerden gazançlar köplenç completitçidir we iň gowy birleşen nusga doly gözleýän baseline ýakyna çykar. Biz alet çykyşlarymyzy FewNLU-ny a çýarys, çykyş çykyşlarymyzy birnäçe sanat yöntemleri bilen birleşdirýäris.', 'af': "Die paar-skoot natuurlike taal verstanding (NLU) taak het baie nuutste aandag aantrek. Maar voorheede metodes is veroordeel onder 'n verskillende stel protokolle, wat hinder regverdige vergelyking en die vordering van die veld te maak. Om hierdie probleem te raak, introduseer ons 'n evalueringsraamwerk wat vorige evalueringsprosedure in drie sleutel aspekte verbeter, t.d. toets prestasie, dev-test korrelasie en stabiliteit. onder hierdie nuwe evalueringsraamwerk, ons reevalueer verskeie staat-van-kuns paar-skoot metodes vir NLU-opdragte. Ons raamwerk vertoon nuwe inligtings: (1) beide die absolute prestasie en relatiewe ontbreiding van die metodes was nie presies in voorheede literaat nie; (2) geen enkele metode dominateer meeste opdragte met konsistente prestasie nie; (3) verbeteringe van sommige metodes verklein met 'n groter verklein model; en (4) van verskillende metodes is dikwels komplementaar en die beste gekombineerde model uitvoer naby 'n sterk volledig ondersoekte basislien. Ons open-source ons nutsbalkit, FewNLU, wat ons evalueringsraamwerk implementeer saam met 'n aantal staat-van-kunstensmetode.", 'sq': 'Detyra e kuptimit natyror të gjuhës (NLU) ka tërhequr shumë vëmendje të fundit. Megjithatë, metodat e mëparshme janë vlerësuar në kuadrin e një sëre të ndryshme protokolli që pengon krahasimin e drejtë dhe matjen e përparimit të fushës. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne futim një kuadër vlerësimi që përmirëson procedurat e vlerësimit të mëparshme në tre aspekte kyçe, pra, rezultatet e testit, korrelacionin dev-test dhe stabilitetin. Sipas këtij kuadri të ri vlerësimi, ne rivlerësojmë disa metoda të vogla për detyrat e NLU. Korniza jonë zbulon kuptime të reja: (1) si performanca absoluta ashtu edhe dallimi relativ i metodave nuk u vlerësuan saktësisht në letërsinë e mëparshme; . (2) asnjë metodë e vetme nuk mbizotëron shumicën e detyrave me performancë konsistente; (3) përmirësimet e disa metodash zvogëlohen me një model më të madh të parastërvitur; dhe (4) fitimet nga metodat e ndryshme janë shpesh komplementare dhe modeli më i kombinuar performon afër një baze të fortë plotësisht mbikqyrur. Ne hapim burimin e paketës tonë mjete, FewNLU, që zbaton kuadrin tonë të vlerësimit së bashku me një numër metodash më të larta.', 'hy': 'Ներջերս շատ ուշադրություն դարձրել է բնական լեզվի հասկանալու (ՆԼՈ) խնդիրը: Այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ մեթոդները գնահատվել են տարբեր պրոտոկոլների շնորհիվ, ինչը խոչընդոտում է արդար համեմատությունը և դաշտի առաջընթացը չափելը: Այս հարցին լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք գնահատման շրջանակ, որը բարելավում է նախորդ գնահատման գործընթացները երեք կարևոր ասպեկտներում, այսինքն՝ փորձարկումների արդյունքը, Dev-փորձարկումների կապը և կայունությունը: Այս նոր գնահատման շրջանակներում մենք վերագնահատում ենք նորաձևակերպ մեթոդներ ՆԼԵ-ի առաջադրանքների համար: Մեր կառուցվածքը բացահայտում է նոր ընկալումներ․ (1) նախկինում եղած գրականության մեթոդների բացարձակ արդյունքը և հարաբերական բացառությունը ճշգրիտ չեն գնահատվել։ (2) ոչ մի մեթոդ չի գերակշռում աշխատանքների մեծ մասը համապատասխան արտադրողականությամբ, (3) որոշ մեթոդների բարելավումները նվազում են ավելի մեծ նախավարժված մոդելի հետ, և (4) տարբեր մեթոդների շահույթը հաճախ համալրացվում է, և լավագույն համադրված մոդելը կատարվում է մոտ ամբողջովին վերահսկվող հզոր հիմքի: Մենք բաց աղբյուր ունենք մեր գործիքների շարքը, FewNSU-ը, որը իրականացնում է մեր գնահատման շրջանակը միասին մի շարք նորագույն մեթոդների հետ:', 'am': 'የጥቂት የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል (NLU) ስራ በቅርብ ዘመን ብዙ ትኩረትን አቀረበ፡፡ ነገር ግን የቀድሞው ሥርዓቶች በተለያዩ የፕሮግራሞች ሥርዓቶች ውስጥ ተካክሎአል፡፡ ለዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ የቀድሞውን የድምፅ ምርጫዎች ሥርዓቶችን በሦስት የቁልፎች ጉዳዮች ውስጥ የሚሻለውን የዋናውን ፍሬም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህም አዲስ ማስታወቂያ ፍሬት ውስጥ የNLU ስራዎችን ለጥቂት የሆኑን የሥርዓት ሥርዓት እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ Our framework reveals new insights:  (1) both the absolute performance and relative gap of the methods were not accurately estimated in prior literature;   (2) አንድ ዓይነት የለበትም አብዛኛውን ስራዎችን በተጨማሪው አካባቢ አይገዛም؛ (3) አንዳንዶቹ የልማድ አካባቢ እና የበለጠ ምሳሌ የሚያጎድል ነው፤ (4) ከልዩ ዓይነቶች የሚደረገው ሀብት ብዙ ጊዜ ተደጋጋፊዎች ናቸው እናም የተሻለ ሞዴል በብርቱ ተሟጋቾች የተደረገ መሠረት ይደረጋል፡፡ የፊwNLU መሣሪያችንን ከክፈት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Prirodno razumijevanje jezika (NLU) koji je malo snimljen privlačio je mnogo nedavne pažnje. Međutim, prethodne metode su procijenjene pod različitim skupom protokola, koji sprječava fer usporedbu i mjerenje napreda polja. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predstavljamo okvir procjene koji poboljšava prethodne procjene u tri ključna aspekta, tj. provedbu testa, korelaciju razvoja testa i stabilnost. Prema ovom novom okviru procjene, ponovno procjenjujemo nekoliko metoda države umjetnosti za NLU zadataka. Naš okvir otkriva nove uvide: (1) i apsolutna funkcija i relativna praznina metoda nisu precizno procijenjena u prethodnoj literaturi; (2) nijedan jedini metod ne dominira većinu zadataka sa konsekvencijom funkcije; (3) poboljšanja nekih metoda smanjuje se sa većim modelom pretkišenog; i (4) dobiti od različitih metoda često su komplementni, a najbolji kombinirani model izvodi blizu jake potpuno nadzirene početne linije. Otvoreni izvorimo naš toolkit, FewNLU, koji implementira naš okvir procjene zajedno sa brojem nacionalnih metoda umjetnosti.', 'ca': "La feina de poca comprensió natural del llenguatge (NLU) ha atraït molta atenció recent. No obstant això, els mètodes anteriors han estat avaluats amb un conjunt de protocols diferents, que dificulta la comparació justa i la mesura del progrés del camp. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, introduïm un marc d'evaluació que millora els procediments d'evaluació anteriors en tres aspectes clau, és a dir, el rendiment de les provas, la correlació de dev-test i l'estabilitat. Sobre aquest nou marc d'evaluació, reevaluam diversos mètodes poc avançats per a les tasques de la NLU. Our framework reveals new insights:  (1) both the absolute performance and relative gap of the methods were not accurately estimated in prior literature;   (2) cap mètode únic no domina la majoria de tasques amb rendiment consistent; (3) la millora d'alguns mètodes disminueix amb un model més gran de pré-entrenament; i (4) els guanys de diferents mètodes sovint són complementars i el millor model combinat actua prop d'una base de referència plenament supervisada. Nosaltres fem un conjunt d'eines de codi obert, FewNLU, que implementa el nostre marc d'evaluació juntament amb alguns mètodes més avançats.", 'az': 'NLU öyrənməsi üçün çox az təbiətli dil anlayışını təşkil etdi. Ancaq əvvəlki metodlar müxtəlif protokollar altında değerləşdirilmişdir, ki, sahənin tədbirini düzgün salmağa və ölçüyə mane edir. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün, əvvəlki değerlendirmə prosedürlərini üç düzgün aspektlərdə daha yaxşılaşdıran değerlendirmə çerçivesini təşkil edirik, məsələn sınama performansı, dev-test correlasyonu və stability. Bu yeni değerlendirmə qurğusu altında, NLU işləri üçün bir neçə-neçə mövcud tərzini yenidən değerlendiririk. Çərçimiz yeni fikirləri ortaya çıxarır: ( 1) metodların tamamlanması və qohumluq boşluğu əvvəlki səhifələrdə doğru hesab edilməmişdir . (2) Heç bir yol müəyyən olunmuş işlərdən çox yüksək işləri müəyyən edir. (3) Bazı metodların yaxşılıqlarını daha böyük bir modellə azaldırır; (4) müxtəlif metodlardan qazanmış qənimətlər çox çox tamamlayır və ən yaxşı birləşdirilmiş modellər tamamilə gözləyirlən səhifə yaxınlaşdırır. Biz araç kitabımızı, FewNLU, bir neçə-neçə sanat metodları ilə birlikdə müəyyən etdik.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বোঝা (এনএলইউ) কাজ সম্প্রতি অনেক মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করেছে। However, prior methods have been evaluated under a disparate set of protocols, which hinders fair comparison and measuring the progress of the field.  এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে আলোচনা করার জন্য আমরা একটি মূল্যবোধ কার্যক্রম পরিচালনা করি যা আগের মূল্যবোধ প্রক্রিয়াকে তিন গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রক্রিয়ায় উন্নত করে, যেমন পরীক্ এই নতুন মূল্যবান ফ্রেমের নীচে আমরা NLU কাজের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প-শুট পদ্ধতি পুনরায় মূল্যায়ন করি। আমাদের ফ্রেমের কাঠামো নতুন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রকাশ করে: (১) এই পদ্ধতির সম্পূর্ণ প্রদর্শন এবং আত্মিক পার্থক্যের পূর্বের সাহিত্যে স (2) কোন একই পদ্ধতি সম্পূর্ণ প্রদর্শনের মাধ্যমে বেশীরভাগ কাজের উপর নেই; (৩) কিছু পদ্ধতির উন্নতি বৃদ্ধি প্রাপ্ত মডেলের সাথে কমে যায়; এবং (৪) বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতি থেকে অর্জন প্রায়শই জটিল এবং সবচেয়ে ভালো সংযুক্ত মডেলের কাছে এক শক্তিশালী পর্যবেক্ষণের বেসার্ভ আমরা আমাদের টুলবিট, ফিউএনএলউ, যা আমাদের মূল্য কার্যক্রম বাস্তবায়িত করে যাচ্ছে বেশ কয়েকটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ শিল্প পদ্ধতির সাথে।', 'et': 'Hiljuti on palju tähelepanu äratanud looduskeele mõistmise vähesuunaline ülesanne. Varasemaid meetodeid on siiski hinnatud erinevate protokollide alusel, mis takistab õiglast võrdlemist ja valdkonna edusammude mõõtmist. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks võtame kasutusele hindamisraamistiku, mis parandab varasemaid hindamismenetlusi kolmes olulises aspektis, st testide tulemuslikkus, arendus-testi korrelatsioon ja stabiilsus. Selle uue hindamisraamistiku alusel hindame uuesti mitmeid NLU ülesannete kaasaegseid meetodeid. Meie raamistik näitab uusi teadmisi: (1) nii meetodite absoluutset tulemuslikkust kui ka suhtelist lõhet ei ole varasemas kirjanduses täpselt hinnatud; (2) enamikus järjepideva tulemusega ülesannetes ei domineeri ükski meetod; (3) mõnede meetodite parandamine väheneb suurema eeltreenitud mudeli puhul; ja (4) erinevatest meetoditest saadav kasu täiendab sageli üksteist ning parim kombineeritud mudel toimib lähedal tugevale täielikult järelevalve all olevale lähtetasemele. Avatud lähtekoodiga tööriistakomplekt FewNLU, mis rakendab meie hindamisraamistikku koos mitmete kaasaegsete meetoditega.', 'cs': 'V poslední době přitahuje mnoho pozornosti úkol, který málo záběrů porozumění přirozenému jazyku (NLU). Předchozí metody však byly hodnoceny na základě rozdílného souboru protokolů, což brání spravedlivému srovnání a měření pokroku v oboru. Pro řešení této problematiky představujeme hodnotící rámec, který zlepšuje předchozí hodnotící postupy ve třech klíčových aspektech, tj. výkonnost testu, korelace vývoje-testu a stabilita. V rámci tohoto nového evaluačního rámce přehodnocujeme několik nejmodernějších metod pro úkoly NLU. Náš rámec odhaluje nové poznatky: (1) absolutní výkonnost a relativní mezera metod nebyly v předchozí literatuře přesně odhadnuty; (2) žádná jediná metoda nedominuje většině úkolů s konzistentním výkonem; (3) zlepšení některých metod se snižuje s větším předtrénovaným modelem; a (4) zisky z různých metod se často doplňují a nejlepší kombinovaný model funguje blízko silnému základnímu základnímu plně dohledu. Otevřeme náš nástroj FewnNLU, který implementuje náš evaluační rámec spolu s řadou nejmodernějších metod.', 'fi': 'Luonnollisen kielen ymmärtäminen (NLU) on herättänyt viime aikoina paljon huomiota. Aiempia menetelmiä on kuitenkin arvioitu erilaisten protokollien mukaisesti, mikä vaikeuttaa tasapuolista vertailua ja kentän edistymisen mittaamista. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi otamme käyttöön arviointikehyksen, joka parantaa aiempia arviointimenettelyjä kolmella keskeisellä osa-alueella: testin suorituskyky, kehitys-testin korrelaatio ja vakaus. Uudessa arviointikehyksessä arvioimme uudelleen useita NLU-tehtävien uusimpia muutaman kuvan menetelmiä. Kehyksemme paljastaa uusia oivalluksia: (1) sekä menetelmien absoluuttista suorituskykyä että suhteellista aukkoa ei ole arvioitu tarkasti aiemmassa kirjallisuudessa; (2) mikään yksittäinen menetelmä ei hallitse useimpia tehtäviä, joilla on johdonmukainen suorituskyky; (3) joidenkin menetelmien parannukset vähenevät suuremmalla esikoulutetulla mallilla; ja (4) eri menetelmistä saatavat hyödyt ovat usein toisiaan täydentäviä ja paras yhdistetty malli toimii lähellä vahvaa täysin valvottua lähtötilannetta. Käytämme avoimen lähdekoodin työkalupakkiamme, FewNLU, joka toteuttaa arviointikehyksemme ja useita viimeisimpiä menetelmiä.', 'sk': 'Naloga razumevanja naravnega jezika (NLU) je v zadnjem času pritegnila veliko pozornosti. Vendar pa so bile predhodne metode ocenjene po različnih protokolih, kar ovira pošteno primerjavo in merjenje napredka na terenu. Za reševanje tega vprašanja uvajamo ocenjevalni okvir, ki izboljšuje predhodne postopke ocenjevanja v treh ključnih vidikih, tj. učinkovitost preskusa, korelacija razvoja-preskusa in stabilnost. V okviru tega novega ocenjevalnega okvira ponovno ocenjujemo več najsodobnejših metod za naloge NLP. Naš okvir razkriva nove vpoglede: (1) tako absolutna uspešnost kot relativna vrzel metod nista bila natančno ocenjena v predhodni literaturi; (2) nobena posamezna metoda ne prevladuje večini nalog z dosledno uspešnostjo; (3) izboljšave nekaterih metod se zmanjšajo z večjim predtreniranim modelom; in (4) dobički iz različnih metod se pogosto dopolnjujejo in najboljši kombinirani model deluje blizu močnega, popolnoma nadzorovanega izhodišča. Odprtokodno uporabljamo naš nabor orodij FewNLU, ki izvaja naš ocenjevalni okvir skupaj s številnimi najsodobnejšimi metodami.', 'jv': 'Terus-shoten saiki perbudhakan nganggo kelas (NLU) seneng nggawe akeh pengguna sampek. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngawe nyimpen nggawe kesalakno iki, kita nyebute akeh operasi kanggo nyebute nggawe barang nggawe barang cara sing wis telu suku tanggal, t.e.g. bisalakno operasi, nggawe operasi Dev-test, lan stabil. Unusual didhake nggawe sistem sing bagian, kita kedisimpen-layanan liyane-layanan liyane-layanan sing perusahaan kanggo nggawe NLU tasks. Cubisa awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan anyar: (1) iso dianggap sing berarti perbudhakan karo hal-hal kuwi dianggap sing nguasai barang dhéwé, kuwi dianggap kuwi bisa dianggap sing apik dhéwé; sing berarti " (3) Ulihke sistem sing ditambah manut karo model sing luwih apik; kuwi mau lan Awak dhéwé éntuk-perusahaan Toolbar, FewNLU, sing nyebutne awak dhéwé nggawe barang sampek karo sistem sing sampek haan-sampek layar-sampek.', 'ha': "Babu fahimtar harshen asiyya (NLU) aikin nan da aka tsõratar da aikin nan na ƙari. However, prior methods have been evaluated under a disparate set of protocols, which hinders fair comparison and measuring the progress of the field.  To, za mu shiga wani firam na evaluci wanda ke kyautata aiki na farko a cikin ƙungiya uku, misali, jarrabon jarrabãwa, danganci na Dev-jarrabi, kuma tabbatarwa. Under wannan firam na ƙaddara, muna iya ƙidãya wasu hanyoyin-state-the-art-few-shot-metode wa aikin NLU. Firmakonmu ya bayyana gannai na new: (1) baƙi da cikakken aikin hanyoyinMu kuma gafukan kwamfyuta ba'a ƙaddara shi daidai a gaba ga littãfi; @ info: whatsthis (3) Kufiɗa wasu shiryoyin ayuka sun ƙara da wata misãlai mai ƙaranci; da mafarin da ke daga hanyoyin dabam-daban, ko da yawa, yana kamfata, kuma mafi kyaun misãlai da suka samu zuwa wani salin mai ƙarfi mai tsaro. Mu buɗe-sourcen kayan aiki, FewNLU, wanda ke cika ma'anarmu da wasu shiryoyin-state-of-the-art.", 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོས་པའི་རང་རིས་སྐད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་བྱ་ཚིག་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེན་སྐྱེན་བྱས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཐབས་ལམ་སྔོན་མ་དེ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་མཐུན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ཡོད། དོན་དག་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཤད་ན་ངེད་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་གལ་ཆེན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསུམ་ནང་གི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བའི་རྐྱེན་གཞུང་ཞིག་སྟོན་བྱེད་དུས། དཔེར་ན དབྱེ་བཟོས་གཞུང་གསར་བ་དེ་ལྟར་པར་ལྡན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གཞུང་གིས་མཐོང་སྣང་གསར་བ་སྟོན་པར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། (2) ལམ་ལུགས་གཅིག་པུ་མིན་ན་ཁྱད་དུ་འཇུག་སྟངས་ཡོད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་མངགས་མེད། (3) ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཞན་ཞིག་གི་ཡར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། (4) ལམ་ལུགས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་རྒྱལ་ཐག་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ལས་ཆེ་མཐོང་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ལག་ཆ་སྟངས་ FewNLU་ལ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་རྩལ་སྒྲིག་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་དང་ཅིག་ཁག་གཙོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'המשימה של הבנה טבעית של שפות קטנות (NLU) משיכה תשומת לב לאחרונה רבה. בכל אופן, שיטות קודמות הוערכו תחת קבוצה שונה של פרוטוקולים, אשר מפריע לשוואה הוגנת ומדידה את התקדמות של השדה. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציגים מסגרת עריכה שמשתפר את הליך הערכה הקודם בשלושה היבטים המרכזים, כלומר ביצועי מבחן, קשר dev-test, וביציבות. תחת הסגרת הערכה החדשה הזאת, אנו מחדש מערכות שיטות של כמה שיטות מוקדמות למשימות NLU. המסגרת שלנו מגלה תובנות חדשות: (1) גם ביצועים מוחלטים וגם הפער יחסי של השיטות לא הוערכו בדיוק בספרות קודמות; (2) שום שיטה אחת לא שולטת ברוב המשימות עם ביצועים קבועים; (3) שיפורים של שיטות מסוימות נמשכים עם מודל גדול יותר מאוחר יותר; and (4) gains from different methods are often complementary and the best combined model performs close to a strong fully-supervised baseline.  We open-source our toolkit, FewNLU, that implements our evaluation framework along with a number of state-of-the-art methods.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'تعلم كيفية التكيف مع التصنيف العام للنص الصفري', 'es': 'Aprenda a adaptarse para la clasificación generalizada de texto de tiro cero', 'pt': 'Aprenda a se adaptar à classificação generalizada de texto Zero-Shot', 'fr': 'Apprenez à vous adapter à la classification généralisée de texte Zero-Shot', 'ja': '一般化されたゼロショットテキスト分類に適応する方法を学ぶ', 'ru': 'Научитесь адаптироваться к обобщенной нулевой текстовой классификации', 'hi': 'सामान्यीकृत शून्य-शॉट पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए अनुकूलन करना सीखें', 'zh': '学适广义零镜头文本分类', 'ga': "Foghlaim conas Oiriúnú d'Aicmiú Téacs Ginearálta Nialais", 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Az általános nulla felvételes szövegosztályozáshoz való alkalmazkodás megtanulása', 'el': 'Μάθετε να προσαρμόζεστε για τη γενική ταξινόμηση κειμένου μηδενικού πυροβολισμού', 'it': 'Impara ad adattarsi alla classificazione generalizzata del testo a scatto zero', 'lt': 'Mokykitės prisitaikyti prie bendros nulinio nuotraukos teksto klasifikacijos', 'kk': 'Жалпы нөл- түйіндегі мәтін классификациясының адаптациясын оқыту', 'mk': 'Научи да се адаптира за генерализирана класификација на текст со нула пукање', 'ms': 'Learn to Adapt for Generalized Zero-Shot Text Classification', 'ml': 'പൊതുവാക്കുന്ന സെറോ- ഷോട്ട് പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Tagħallem jadatta għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test Ġeneralizzat Żero-Shot', 'mn': 'Жалпы нууц-Shot текст классификацийг давхарлах боломжтой суралцах', 'no': 'Lær å tilpassa for generellisert nullstort tekstklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'Naucz się dostosowywać do ogólnej klasyfikacji tekstu zerowego', 'ro': 'Învățați să vă adaptați pentru clasificarea generală a textului Zero-Shot', 'sr': 'Naučite se prilagoditi za generalizovanu klasifikaciju teksta nula pucnjava', 'so': 'Baro Adapt for General Zero-Shot Text Classification', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය සීරෝ වෙඩි පාළු ක්\u200dරියාසිකරණයට සැකසුම් කරන්න ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'sv': 'Lär dig att anpassa dig för generell textklassificering utan skott', 'ta': 'பொதுவான சூட்- ஷாட் உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு ஏற்ற கற்றுக்கொள்', 'ur': 'جنرال صفر-شٹ کے لئے اڈسٹ کرنا سیکھو', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học cách thích nghi cho KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Научете се да се адаптирате към общата класификация на текст с нулев изстрел', 'da': 'Lær at tilpasse sig til generel tekstklassifikation med nulskud', 'hr': 'Naučite se prilagoditi za generaliziranu klasifikaciju teksta nula pucnjava', 'nl': 'Leer je aan te passen voor een algemene nul-shot tekstclassificatie', 'de': 'Lernen Sie, sich an die allgemeine Zero-Shot-Textklassifizierung anzupassen', 'id': 'Belajar untuk menyesuaikan untuk Klasifikasi Teks Zero-Shot Umum', 'ko': '학습 적응 광의 제로 렌즈 텍스트 분류', 'fa': 'یاد بگیرید که برای کلاس\u200cسازی متن\u200cهای صفر- شلیک\u200cشده\u200cی عمومی تغییر دهید', 'af': 'Leer om te pas vir Generaliseer Nuwe Shot Teks Klassifikasie', 'sw': 'Jifunze upatikanaji kwa Makala ya Kupigwa Kizuizini', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'sq': 'Mëso të përshtatet për klasifikimin e gjeneralizuar zero-shot të tekstit', 'tr': 'Umumy 0-täze metin klassifikasiýasy üçin üýtgetmek öwreniň', 'hy': 'Սովորեցնել հարմարվել ընդհանուր զրո-կրակի տեքստի դասակարգման համար', 'bs': 'Naučite se prilagoditi za generaliziranu klasifikaciju teksta nula pucnjava', 'az': 'Sıfır-Shot Metin Sınıflaması üçün Adlandırmaq öyrənin', 'bn': 'সাধারণ জিরো- শুট টেক্সট ব্যবহারের জন্য অ্যাডাপ্ট শিখুন', 'ca': 'Apreneu a adaptar-se a la classificació generalitzada de text sense dispars', 'cs': 'Naučte se přizpůsobit se všeobecné klasifikaci textu nulovým záběrem', 'et': 'Õppige kohanema üldise nullkatse teksti klassifikatsiooni jaoks', 'fi': 'Opi sopeutumaan yleiseen nollakuvauksen tekstiluokitukseen', 'jv': 'Learn to Adjusting for Generalizated nulo-shot text', 'sk': 'Naučite se prilagoditi splošni klasifikaciji besedila brez posnetka', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'ללמוד להתאים לסימן טקסט אפס', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་Zero-Shot ཡི་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'Due to high data demands of current methods, attention to zero-shot cross-lingual spoken language understanding (SLU) has grown, as such approaches greatly reduce human annotation effort. However, existing models solely rely on shared parameters, which can only perform implicit alignment across languages. We present Global-Local Contrastive Learning Framework (GL-CLeF) to address this shortcoming. Specifically, we employ contrastive learning, leveraging bilingual dictionaries to construct multilingual views of the same utterance, then encourage their representations to be more similar than negative example pairs, which achieves to explicitly align representations of similar sentences across languages. In addition, a key step in GL-CLeF is a proposed Local and Global component, which achieves a fine-grained cross-lingual transfer (i.e., sentence-level Local intent transfer, token-level Local slot transfer, and semantic-level Global transfer across intent and slot). Experiments on MultiATIS++ show that GL-CLeF achieves the best performance and successfully pulls representations of similar sentences across languages closer.', 'ar': 'يهدف تصنيف نص اللقطة الصفرية المعمم إلى تصنيف الأمثلة النصية من كل من الفئات التي تمت رؤيتها مسبقًا والفئات غير المرئية الناشئة بشكل متزايد. معظم الطرق الحالية تعمم بشكل سيء لأن المعلمات التي تم تعلمها هي الأمثل فقط للفئات المرئية بدلاً من كلا الفئتين ، وتبقى المعلمات ثابتة في التنبؤ بالإجراءات. لمواجهة هذه التحديات ، نقترح شبكة جديدة تعلم التكيف (LTA) باستخدام إطار عمل التعلم التلوي المتغير. على وجه التحديد ، تقوم LTA بتدريب المصنف التكيفي باستخدام كل من الفصول المرئية والظاهرية غير المرئية لمحاكاة سيناريو التعلم الشامل (GZSL) وفقًا لوقت الاختبار ، ويتعلم في نفس الوقت معايرة النماذج الأولية للفصل وعينة التمثيل لجعل المعلمات المكتسبة تتكيف مع الفصول غير المرئية الواردة. ندعي أن النموذج المقترح قادر على تمثيل جميع النماذج الأولية والعينات من كلا الفئتين لتوزيع أكثر اتساقًا في مساحة عالمية. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على خمس مجموعات بيانات لتصنيف النص أن نموذجنا يتفوق على العديد من المناهج السابقة التنافسية بهوامش كبيرة. يتوفر الرمز ومجموعات البيانات بأكملها على https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'fr': "La classification de texte zero-shot généralisée vise à classer les instances textuelles à la fois des classes vues précédemment et des classes non vues émergentes de manière incrémentielle. La plupart des méthodes existantes se généralisent mal puisque les paramètres appris ne sont optimaux que pour les classes vues plutôt que pour les deux classes, et les paramètres restent stationnaires dans les procédures de prédiction. Pour relever ces défis, nous proposons un nouveau réseau LTA (Learn to Adapt) utilisant un framework de méta-apprentissage variant. Plus précisément, LTA entraîne un classificateur adaptatif en utilisant à la fois des classes vues et des classes invisibles virtuelles pour simuler un scénario d'apprentissage à zéro généralisé (GZSL) en fonction du temps de test, et apprend simultanément à étalonner les prototypes de classe et les représentations d'échantillons pour obtenir les paramètres appris adaptatif aux classes non vues entrantes. Nous affirmons que le modèle proposé est capable de représenter tous les prototypes et échantillons des deux classes selon une distribution plus cohérente dans un espace global. Des expériences approfondies sur cinq ensembles de données de classification de texte montrent que notre modèle surpasse de loin plusieurs approches concurrentielles précédentes. Le code et l'ensemble des ensembles de données sont disponibles sur https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'pt': 'A classificação de texto zero-shot generalizada visa classificar instâncias textuais de classes vistas anteriormente e classes invisíveis emergentes de forma incremental. A maioria dos métodos existentes generaliza mal, uma vez que os parâmetros aprendidos são ótimos apenas para classes vistas e não para ambas as classes, e os parâmetros permanecem estacionários nos procedimentos de previsão. Para enfrentar esses desafios, propomos uma nova rede Learn to Adapt (LTA) usando uma estrutura de meta-aprendizagem variante. Especificamente, o LTA treina um classificador adaptativo usando classes vistas e virtuais não vistas para simular um cenário de aprendizado generalizado de tiro zero (GZSL) de acordo com o tempo de teste e simultaneamente aprende a calibrar os protótipos de classe e representações de amostra para fazer os parâmetros aprendidos adaptável às classes invisíveis recebidas. Afirmamos que o modelo proposto é capaz de representar todos os protótipos e amostras de ambas as classes para uma distribuição mais consistente em um espaço global. Extensos experimentos em cinco conjuntos de dados de classificação de texto mostram que nosso modelo supera várias abordagens anteriores competitivas por grandes margens. O código e todos os conjuntos de dados estão disponíveis em https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'es': 'La clasificación generalizada de texto zero-shot tiene como objetivo clasificar las instancias textuales tanto de las clases vistas anteriormente como de las clases invisibles emergentes incrementalmente. La mayoría de los métodos existentes se generalizan mal, ya que los parámetros aprendidos solo son óptimos para las clases vistas en lugar de para ambas clases, y los parámetros se mantienen estacionarios en los procedimientos de predicción. Para abordar estos desafíos, proponemos una nueva red Learn to Adapt (LTA) que utiliza un marco de meta-aprendizaje variante. Específicamente, LTA entrena un clasificador adaptativo mediante el uso de clases visibles y virtuales no vistas para simular un escenario de aprendizaje generalizado de tiro cero (GZSL) de acuerdo con el tiempo de prueba, y simultáneamente aprende a calibrar los prototipos de clase y las representaciones de muestra para hacer los parámetros aprendidos adaptativo a las clases entrantes que no se ven. Afirmamos que el modelo propuesto es capaz de representar todos los prototipos y muestras de ambas clases para una distribución más consistente en un espacio global. Los extensos experimentos en cinco conjuntos de datos de clasificación de textos muestran que nuestro modelo supera a varios enfoques anteriores de la competencia por amplios márgenes. El código y todos los conjuntos de datos están disponibles en https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ja': '一般化されたゼロショットテキスト分類は、以前に見たクラスと増分的に出現する見えないクラスの両方からテキストインスタンスを分類することを目的としている。 既存の方法のほとんどは、学習されたパラメータは両方のクラスではなく、見られたクラスに最適であるだけであり、パラメータは予測手順で静止しているため、一般化が不十分である。 これらの課題に対処するために、私たちは異なったメタラーニングフレームワークを使用して、新しい学習適応（ LTA ）ネットワークを提案します。 具体的には、LTAは、一般化されたゼロショット学習（ GZSL ）シナリオを試験時間に従ってシミュレートするために、見えるクラスと仮想見えないクラスの両方を使用することによって適応型分類子を訓練し、同時に、クラスのプロトタイプとサンプル表現を較正して、学習されたパラメータを受信された見えないクラスに適応させることを学習する。 提案されたモデルは、両方のクラスのすべてのプロトタイプとサンプルをグローバル空間でより一貫した分布に表すことができると主張しています。 5つのテキスト分類データセットに関する広範な実験は、当社のモデルが、いくつかの競合する以前のアプローチを大幅なマージンで上回っていることを示しています。 コードとデータセット全体はhttps://github.com/Quareia/LTAで入手できます。', 'zh': '广义零镜头文本类,前见之类,渐见之类中类中类也。 大抵见法之泛化甚劣,学者参数见类而非二者皆优,而参数平于占候也。 为此挑战,变体元学框架者新型学适(LTA)网络。 LTA以可见、虚拟不见之类来教自适分类器,以试时拟广义零次学(GZSL)场景,兼习校准类原型样本,以应学参数之未见之类。 吾言模形能将两类原型与样本为一局空间更一般。 五本博实验,形胜前数。 代码与全数集 https://github.com/Quareia/LTA。', 'hi': 'सामान्यीकृत शून्य-शॉट पाठ वर्गीकरण का उद्देश्य पहले से देखे गए वर्गों और वृद्धिशील रूप से उभरते हुए अनदेखी कक्षाओं दोनों से पाठ्य उदाहरणों को वर्गीकृत करना है। अधिकांश मौजूदा तरीके खराब रूप से सामान्यीकृत होते हैं क्योंकि सीखे गए पैरामीटर दोनों वर्गों के बजाय केवल देखे गए वर्गों के लिए इष्टतम होते हैं, और पैरामीटर प्रक्रियाओं की भविष्यवाणी करने में स्थिर रहते हैं। इन चुनौतियों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक संस्करण मेटा-लर्निंग फ्रेमवर्क का उपयोग करके एक उपन्यास लर्न टू एडाप्ट (एलटीए) नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, एलटीए परीक्षण समय के अनुसार एक सामान्यीकृत शून्य-शॉट लर्निंग (जीजेडएसएल) परिदृश्य का अनुकरण करने के लिए देखा और आभासी अनदेखी कक्षाओं दोनों का उपयोग करके एक अनुकूली क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करता है, और साथ ही साथ कक्षा प्रोटोटाइप और नमूना प्रतिनिधित्व को कैलिब्रेट करना सीखता है ताकि आने वाली अनदेखी कक्षाओं के लिए अनुकूली मापदंडों को अनुकूलित किया जा सके। हम दावा करते हैं कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल वैश्विक अंतरिक्ष में अधिक सुसंगत वितरण के लिए दोनों वर्गों से सभी प्रोटोटाइप और नमूनों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने में सक्षम है। पांच पाठ वर्गीकरण डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल बड़े मार्जिन से कई प्रतिस्पर्धी पिछले दृष्टिकोणों को मात देता है। कोड और पूरे डेटासेट https://github.com/Quareia/LTA पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Обобщенная классификация текста с нулевым выстрелом направлена на классификацию текстовых экземпляров как из ранее просматриваемых классов, так и из постепенно возникающих невидимых классов. Большинство существующих методов обобщаются плохо, так как изученные параметры являются оптимальными только для классов, наблюдаемых, а не для обоих классов, и параметры остаются неподвижными при прогнозировании процедур. Для решения этих проблем мы предлагаем новую сеть обучения адаптации (LTA), использующую вариативную систему метаобучения. В частности, LTA обучает адаптивный классификатор, используя как видимые, так и виртуальные невидимые классы для моделирования обобщенного сценария обучения с нулевым выстрелом (GZSL) в соответствии со временем тестирования, и одновременно учится калибровать прототипы классов и образцы представлений, чтобы сделать изученные параметры адаптивными к входящим невидимым классам. Мы утверждаем, что предлагаемая модель способна представить все прототипы и образцы из обоих классов для более последовательного распределения в глобальном пространстве. Широкие эксперименты с пятью наборами данных классификации текста показывают, что наша модель превосходит несколько конкурентоспособных предыдущих подходов с большим запасом. Код и все наборы данных доступны по адресу https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag rangú téacs ginearálaithe náid samplaí téacs a rangú ó ranganna a chonacthas roimhe seo agus ó ranganna nach bhfacthas de réir a chéile a thagann chun cinn go hincriminteach. Tá drochghinearálú déanta ar fhormhór na modhanna atá ann cheana féin toisc nach bhfuil na paraiméadair fhoghlama optamacha ach amháin i gcás ranganna feicthe seachas don dá rang, agus fanann na paraiméadair ina stad maidir le nósanna imeachta a thuar. Chun dul i ngleic leis na dúshláin seo, molaimid líonra nua Foghlaim conas Oiriúnú (LTA) a úsáid ag baint úsáide as creat meitea-fhoghlaim athraitheach. Go sonrach, déanann LTA aicmitheoir oiriúnaitheach a oiliúint trí úsáid a bhaint as ranganna feicthe agus fíorúla neamhfheicthe chun cás foghlama ginearálaithe náid (GZSL) a insamhail de réir an ama tástála, agus foghlaimíonn sé ag an am céanna na fréamhshamhlacha ranga agus léirithe samplacha a chalabrú chun na paraiméadair fhoghlama a dhéanamh. in oiriúint do ranganna nua nach bhfacthas riamh cheana. Éilímid go bhfuil an tsamhail atá beartaithe in ann gach fréamhshamhail agus sampla ón dá rang a léiriú go dáileadh níos comhsheasmhaí i spás domhanda. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar chúig thacar sonraí aicmithe téacs go sáraíonn ár samhail cur chuige iomaíoch go leor roimhe seo le corrlaigh mhóra. Tá an cód agus na tacair shonraí iomlána ar fáil ag https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'el': 'Η γενικευμένη ταξινόμηση κειμένου μηδενικού πυροβολισμού έχει ως στόχο να ταξινομήσει τις περιπτώσεις κειμένου τόσο από προηγούμενες τάξεις όσο και από τις βαθμιαία αναδυόμενες αθέητες τάξεις. Οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι γενικεύονται ελάχιστα δεδομένου ότι οι μαθημένες παράμετροι είναι βέλτιστες μόνο για τις ορατές τάξεις παρά για τις δύο τάξεις, και οι παράμετροι παραμένουν σταθερές στην πρόβλεψη των διαδικασιών. Για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των προκλήσεων, προτείνουμε ένα νέο δίκτυο εκμάθησης προσαρμογής χρησιμοποιώντας ένα εναλλακτικό πλαίσιο μετα-μάθησης. Συγκεκριμένα, εκπαιδεύει έναν προσαρμοστικό ταξινομητή χρησιμοποιώντας τόσο ορατές όσο και εικονικές αόρατες τάξεις για την προσομοίωση ενός γενικευμένου σεναρίου μάθησης μηδενικού πυροβολισμού (σύμφωνα με το χρόνο δοκιμής, και ταυτόχρονα μαθαίνει να βαθμονομεί τα πρωτότυπα κλάσης και τις αναπαραστάσεις δειγμάτων για να κάνει τις μαθημένες παραμέτρους προσαρμοστικές στις εισερχόμενες αόρατες τάξεις. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο είναι ικανό να αναπαριστά όλα τα πρωτότυπα και δείγματα και από τις δύο κατηγορίες σε μια πιο συνεπή κατανομή σε έναν παγκόσμιο χώρο. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε πέντε σύνολα δεδομένων ταξινόμησης κειμένου δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά αρκετές ανταγωνιστικές προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις με μεγάλα περιθώρια. Ο κώδικας και όλα τα σύνολα δεδομένων είναι διαθέσιμα στη διεύθυνση https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'hu': 'Az általános nulla-shot szövegosztályozás célja, hogy osztályozza a szöveges példányokat mind a korábban látott osztályokból, mind pedig fokozatosan megjelenő láthatatlan osztályokból. A legtöbb meglévő módszer rosszul általánosít, mivel a megtanult paraméterek csak a látott osztályok számára optimálisak, nem mindkét osztály számára, és a paraméterek állandóak maradnak az előrejelzési eljárások során. E kihívások kezelése érdekében egy új Learn to adapt (LTA) hálózatot javasolunk variáns metatanulási keretrendszerrel. Konkrétan, az LTA egy adaptív osztályozót képez mind a láthatatlan, mind a virtuális láthatatlan osztályok használatával, hogy szimuláljon egy általános nulla lövéses tanulási (GZSL) forgatókönyvet a tesztidőnek megfelelően, és egyidejűleg megtanulja kalibrálni az osztály prototípusait és a minta reprezentációit, hogy a tanult paraméterek alkalmazkodjanak a bejövő láthatatlan osztályokhoz. Azt állítjuk, hogy a javasolt modell képes mindkét osztályból származó prototípusokat és mintákat ábrázolni egy következetesebb globális térben. Öt szövegosztályozási adatkészleten végzett kiterjedt kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk nagy margóval felülmúlja a versenyképes korábbi megközelítéseket. A kód és a teljes adatkészlet elérhető a következő oldalon: https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ka': 'ჩართულია ტექსტის კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც უნდა იყოს, რომ ტექსტური ინსტენსტის კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც წინ ხედავთ კლასიდან და ინქმენტურად უნდა იყოს კლასიდან. უფრო მეტი არსებობს პროგრამეტრების გენერალაცია, რადგან სწავლილი პროგრამეტრები მხოლოდ აპტიმალურია ჩვენებული კლასებისთვის, არა ორივე კლასებისთვის, და პრამეტრებ ამ გამოცდილებების შესახებ, ჩვენ პრომენტის შესწავლობა (LTA) ქსელის აეპტიფიკაციის გამოყენება მეტა-სწავლების ფრამეტზე. განსაკუთრებულია, LTA მოწყენებს აპეტიფიური კლასიფიკარის გამოყენებით და ვირტუალური უცნობილი კლასის სინარიოს, რომელიც უცნობილი ნულ სტატის სწავლებას (GZSL) სინარიოს სინარიოს სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენ ვთქვათ, რომ მოდელი შეუძლებელია ყველა პროტოტიპები და მონაცემები ორივე კლასიდან უფრო კონსტური გაყოფილი გლობალური სივრცეში. ხუთი ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემების გამოსახულებული ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო მეტი კონპექციური წინახულება დიდი მარტინტებით გავაკ კოდი და ყველა მონაცემების შესაძლებელია https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'it': "La classificazione generalizzata del testo zero-shot mira a classificare istanze testuali sia da classi viste precedentemente che da classi non viste emergenti incrementalmente. La maggior parte dei metodi esistenti generalizzano male poiché i parametri appresi sono ottimali solo per le classi viste piuttosto che per entrambe le classi, e i parametri rimangono fermi nelle procedure di previsione. Per affrontare queste sfide, proponiamo una nuova rete Learn to Adapt (LTA) utilizzando un framework di meta-apprendimento variante. Nello specifico, LTA allena un classificatore adattivo utilizzando classi invisibili sia viste che virtuali per simulare uno scenario generalizzato di apprendimento zero-shot (GZSL) in conformità con il tempo di prova, e contemporaneamente impara a calibrare i prototipi di classe e le rappresentazioni di campione per rendere i parametri appresi adattabili alle classi invisibili in arrivo. Noi affermiamo che il modello proposto è in grado di rappresentare tutti i prototipi e campioni di entrambe le classi per una distribuzione più coerente in uno spazio globale. Esperimenti approfonditi su cinque set di dati di classificazione del testo mostrano che il nostro modello supera diversi approcci precedenti competitivi con ampi margini. Il codice e l'intero set di dati sono disponibili all'indirizzo https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'lt': 'Bendra nulinės nuotraukos teksto klasifikacija siekiama klasifikuoti tekstinius pavyzdžius tiek iš anksčiau matytų klasių, tiek iš laipsniškai atsirandančių nematomų klasių. Dauguma esamų metodų prastai generalizuoja, nes išmokti parametrai yra optimal ūs tik matomoms klasėms, o ne abiem klasėms, o parametrai lieka stovintys prognozavimo procedūrose. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos uždavinius, siūlome naują mokymosi prisitaikyti tinklą naudojant alternatyvią metamokymosi sistemą. Konkrečiai, LTA moko pritaikomąjį klasifikatorių naudojant tiek matomas, tiek virtualiai nematomas klases, kad simuliuotų visuotinį nulinio nuotraukos mokymosi (GZSL) scenarijų pagal bandymo laiką, ir tuo pačiu metu išmoko kalibruoti klasės prototipus ir mėginių atspaudus, kad išmokti parametrai būtų pritaikyti prie ateinančių nematomų klasių. Mes teigiame, kad siūlomas model is gali atspindėti visus abiejų klasių prototipus ir mėginius nuosekliau platinant pasaulyje. Išsamūs eksperimentai su penkiais tekstų klasifikavimo duomenų rinkiniais rodo, kad mūsų modelis iš esmės viršija kelis konkurencinius ankstesnius metodus. Kodas ir visi duomenų rinkiniai pateikiami https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'kk': 'Жалпы нөл- шоу мәтін классификациясы, бұрынғы көрінілген класстардың екі мәтін инстанцияларын да классификациялауға мақсат береді. Бар әдістердің көпшілігі білім параметрлері екі класс орнына көрінетін класс үшін ғана оптималдық болып жатқан, және параметрлері алдындағы процедурлерде дұрыс тұрады. Бұл мәселелерді өзгерту үшін біз романдық мета оқыту бағдарламасын қолданып (LTA) желіне адаптациялауды оқытуды ұсынамыз. Әдетте, LTA сынақ уақытына сәйкес келесі жалпы нөл түрлі оқыту (GZSL) сценариясын түрлендіру үшін көрінілген және виртуалды түрлі классификациялық классификациялық класс прототиптерін түрлендіру үшін жұмыс істейтін класс прототиптерін және үлгі түрлі түрлен Біз таңдалған үлгісі барлық прототиптерді және үлгілерді екі классынан жалпы орында тұрақты үлестіру үшін көрсетуге болады деп ойлаймыз. Бес мәтін классификациялау деректер қорларындағы кеңейтілген тәжірибелер үлкен шектермен бірнеше бұрынғы жағдайларды өзгертуге болады. Код мен барлық деректер жиындары бар https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'mk': 'Генерализираната нуларна класификација на текст има за цел класификација на текстуални инстанции од претходно видени класи и постојано се појавуваат невидени класи. Повеќето постоечки методи се генерализираат лошо бидејќи научените параметри се оптимални само за видени класи наместо за двете класи, а параметрите остануваат стационални во процедурите на предвидување. To address these challenges, we propose a novel Learn to Adapt (LTA) network using a variant meta-learning framework.  Специфично, ЛТА обучува адаптивен класификатор со користење на видени и виртуелни невидени класи за симулирање на генерализирано нуларно-снимање (GZSL) сценарио во согласност со времето на тест, и истовремено научи да ги калибрира прототипите на класата и претставувањата на примероците за да ги направи научените параметри адаптивни на Ние тврдиме дека предложениот модел е способен да ги претставува сите прототипи и примероци од двете класи до поконстантна дистрибуција во глобалниот простор. Експериментите на пет податоци за класификација на текст покажуваат дека нашиот модел надминува неколку конкурентни претходни пристапи со големи маргини. Кодот и целите податоци се достапни на https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi teks-tembakan sifar yang dijalankan bermaksud untuk mengklasifikasikan kejadian teks dari kedua-dua kelas yang telah dilihat sebelumnya dan kelas yang tidak terlihat yang terungkap muncul. Kebanyakan kaedah yang wujud mengawal buruk kerana parameter yang belajar hanya optimal untuk kelas yang dilihat daripada untuk kedua-dua kelas, dan parameter tetap stesen dalam prosedur meramalkan. Untuk mengatasi cabaran ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian belajar untuk menyesuaikan (LTA) novel menggunakan rangkaian meta-belajar varian. Secara khusus, LTA melatih pengukur penyesuaian dengan menggunakan kedua-dua kelas yang terlihat dan tidak terlihat maya untuk simulasi skenario pembelajaran tembakan sifar (GZSL) secara umum sesuai dengan masa ujian, dan secara bersamaan belajar untuk mengkalibrasi prototip kelas dan perwakilan sampel untuk membuat parameter belajar menyesuaikan kepada kelas yang tidak terlihat masuk. Kami menyatakan bahawa model yang diusulkan mampu mewakili semua prototip dan sampel dari kedua-dua kelas ke distribusi yang lebih konsisten dalam ruang global. Eksperimen luas pada lima set data klasifikasi teks menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui beberapa pendekatan terdahulu kompetitif dengan margin besar. The code and the whole datasets are available at  https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ml': 'പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി ക്ലാസുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മുമ്പ് കണ്ടിട്ടുള്ള ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d സ്ഥിതികങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫുള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള പൂര്\u200dണ് നിലവിലുള്ള മികച്ച രീതികള്\u200d വളരെ ദുര്\u200dബലമായി സംഭവിക്കുന്നു. പഠിച്ച പരാമീറ്ററുകള്\u200d രണ്ടു ക്ലാസുകള്\u200dക്കും പകരം കാണുന്നതിന് മാത്രമാണ്  ഈ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, LTA കണ്ടുപിടിച്ചും വാര്\u200dച്ച്വല്\u200d അദൃശ്യ ക്ലാസുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണസമയത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പൂജ്യത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പൂജ്യത്തിന്റെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ (GZSL) പഠ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d എല്ലാ പ്രോട്ടോട്ടിപ്പുകളും മാമ്പുകളും പ്രതിനിധിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിവുള്ളതാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നു. രണ് Extensive experiments on five text classification datasets show that our model outperforms several competitive previous approaches by large margins.  കോഡും എല്ലാ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും ലഭ്യമല്ല https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'no': 'Generalisert tekstklassifikasjon med nullsatt måtar å klassifisera tekstinstansar frå både før sette klassar og aukande utgåande ukjende klassar. Dei fleste eksisterande metodane generelliserer slik dårlig sidan dei lærte parametra er berre optimal for sette klasser i staden for begge klasser, og parametrane held stadig i forhåndsvising av prosedyrar. For å handtera desse utfordringane, foreslår vi eit roman læring å tilpassa (LTA) nettverk med ein variant metalæringsrammeverk. Oppgjengeleg, LTA treng eit adaptivt klassifiserer ved å bruka både synde og virtuelle ukjende klassar for å simulera ein generelt nullstiller (GZSL) scenario i samsvar med testtiden, og lærer samtidig å kalibrera klassesprototypane og prøverepresentasjonane for å gjera lærte parametra tilpassande til innkommende ukjende klassar. Vi tvar at den foreslåde modellen er i stand til å representera alle prototypar og prøver frå begge klassar til ein meir konsistent distribusjon i eit globalt plass. Ekstra eksperimenter på fem tekstklassifikasjonsdata viser at modellen vårt utfører fleire konkurentære førre tilnærmingar med store marginar. Koden og heile dataset er tilgjengelege på https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'pl': 'Uogólniona klasyfikacja tekstu zero-shot ma na celu klasyfikację instancji tekstowych zarówno z wcześniej widzianych klas, jak i stopniowo pojawiających się niewidzialnych klas. Większość istniejących metod słabo uogólnia, ponieważ nauczone parametry są optymalne tylko dla widzianych klas, a nie dla obu klas, a parametry pozostają nieruchome w procedurach przewidywania. Aby sprostać tym wyzwaniom, proponujemy nową sieć Learn to Adapt (LTA) z wykorzystaniem wariantowego frameworku meta-learning. W szczególności LTA szkoli adaptacyjny klasyfikator, używając zarówno widocznych, jak i wirtualnych niewidocznych klas do symulacji uogólnionego scenariusza uczenia się zero-shot learning (GZSL) zgodnie z czasem testu, a jednocześnie uczy się kalibrować prototypy klas i reprezentacje próbek, aby uczynić nauczone parametry adaptacyjne do przychodzących niewidocznych klas. Twierdzimy, że proponowany model jest w stanie reprezentować wszystkie prototypy i próbki z obu klas do bardziej spójnego rozkładu w przestrzeni globalnej. Obszerne eksperymenty na pięciu zestawach danych klasyfikacji tekstu pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa kilka konkurencyjnych poprzednich podejść o duże marże. Kod i całe zbiory danych są dostępne pod adresem: https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'mt': "Generalized zero-shot text classification aims to classify textual instances from both previously seen classes and incrementally emerging unseen classes.  Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi eżistenti jiġġeneralizzaw ħażin peress li l-parametri miksuba huma ottimali biss għall-klassijiet osservati aktar milli għaż-żewġ klassijiet, u l-parametri jżommu stazzjonarji fil-proċeduri ta’ tbassir. Biex nindirizzaw dawn l-isfidi, nipproponu netwerk ġdid ta' Tagħlim għall-Adattament (LTA) bl-użu ta' qafas varjat ta' meta-tagħlim. Speċifikament, LTA tħarreġ klassifikatur adattiv billi tuża kemm klassijiet li jidhru kif ukoll dawk virtwali li ma jidhrux biex tissimula xenarju ġeneralizzat ta’ tagħlim b’ritratt żero (GZSL) skont il-ħin tat-test, u fl-istess ħin titgħallem li tikkalibra l-prototipi tal-klassi u r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kampjuni biex il-parametri mitgħallma jsiru adattati għall-klassijiet li ma jidhrux li jidħlu. Aħna niddikjaraw li l-mudell propost huwa kapaċi jirrappreżenta l-prototipi u l-kampjuni kollha miż-żewġ klassijiet għal distribuzzjoni aktar konsistenti fi spazju globali. Esperimenti estensivi fuq ħames settijiet ta’ dejta dwar il-klassifikazzjoni tat-testi juru li l-mudell tagħna jwettaq diversi approċċi kompetittivi preċedenti b’marġini kbar. Il-kodiċi u s-settijiet tad-dejta kollha huma disponibbli fuq https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'mn': 'Нэг зураг бичсэн текст хуваалтын төлөвлөгөө нь өмнө нь харсан хичээлийн хоёр дахин, нэмэлтэй харагдахгүй хичээлийн хуваалтын төлөвлөгөө юм. Ихэнх сургалтын арга нь зөвхөн сургалтын параметрлүүд хичээл хоёр хичээлийн оронд зөвхөн харагдах хичээлийн хувьд зөвхөн эерэг байдаг, харин параметрлүүд процедурыг тодорхойлж байдаг. Эдгээр сорилтуудыг удирдахын тулд бид шинэ зохиолын суралцах (LTA) сүлжээг өөр өөр мета суралцах системийг ашиглаж суралцах зохиолыг санал болгоно. Тухайлбал, LTA дасгал хөдөлгөөнтэй хоёулаа харагдаагүй, виртуал харагдаагүй хичээлийг ашиглан шалгалтын хугацаа (GZSL) шинжлэх ухааны хувилбарыг шинжлэх ухааны хугацаанд шинжлэх ухааны хугацаанд шинжлэх ухаан авч, хичээлийн прототип болон шалгалтын үзүүлэлтийг ши Бид санал өгсөн загвар нь дэлхийн орон зайд бүх прототип болон sample-ыг илэрхийлэх боломжтой гэж хэлж байна. Таван текст хэлбэрийн өгөгдлийн сангийн өргөн туршилтууд бидний загвар нь хэдэн өрсөлдөг өмнө өрсөлдөг ойлголтыг том хэмжээгээр дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Код болон бүх өгөгдлийн сангууд https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea generală a textului zero-shot are ca scop clasificarea instanțelor textuale atât din clasele văzute anterior, cât și din clasele nevăzute emergente treptat. Cele mai multe metode existente generalizează slab, deoarece parametrii învățați sunt optimi doar pentru clasele văzute, mai degrabă decât pentru ambele clase, iar parametrii rămân staționari în procedurile de predicție. Pentru a aborda aceste provocări, propunem o rețea nouă Învățați să adaptați (LTA) utilizând un cadru meta-învățare variantă. În mod specific, LTA antrenează un clasificator adaptiv utilizând atât clasele văzute, cât și cele virtuale nevăzute pentru a simula un scenariu generalizat de învățare zero-shot (GZSL) în conformitate cu timpul de testare și simultan învață să calibrați prototipurile clasei și reprezentările eșantioanelor pentru a face parametrii învățați adaptivi la clasele nevăzute primite. Susținem că modelul propus este capabil să reprezinte toate prototipurile și eșantioanele din ambele clase la o distribuție mai consistentă într-un spațiu global. Experimente ample pe cinci seturi de date de clasificare a textelor arată că modelul nostru depășește mai multe abordări competitive anterioare cu marje mari. Codul și seturile de date întregi sunt disponibile la adresa https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'so': 'Tusaale-qoraalka qoraalka qoraalka lagu qoray waxaa loola jeedaa in lagu kala soocayo dhacdooyinka qoraalka ee hore laga arkay fasalka iyo fasalka qarsoon. Inta badan qaababka joogta ayaa si xun u sameeya, sababtoo ah parameters la bartay waxay u eg yihiin fasalka la arko oo ka bedela fasalka labada fasalka, parameterkuna waxay ku haystaan meelaha la sii sheegayo. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatooyinkaas, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa shabakadda Adapt (LTA) oo lagu isticmaalayo framework kala duduwan meta-barashada. Si gaar ah, LTA waxay u tababaridaa fasalka la isku habboon, si ay u simisaan fasalka la arko iyo fasalka qarsoon ee a an la arkayn (GZSL) si uu u barto waxbarashada zero-shot si waafaqsan waqtiga imtixaanka, isla markaasna waxay bartaan in la kalibeeyo fasalka prototypada iyo tusaalaha si ay bartaan parameters u habboon fasalka qarsoon. Waxaynu sheegaynaa in muusikada la soo jeeday uu awoodo in uu ka represento noocyada oo dhan iyo samooyinka labada fasalka oo uu u qaybsado meel caalami ah. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku qoran shan takhasuska tababarida qoraalka ah waxay muujiyaan in modelkayagu uu sameeyo marooyin badan oo iskhilaafsan ee horay u socday. Kaarka iyo dhamaanka macluumaadka waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'sr': 'Generalizirana klasifikacija teksta sa nulom snimkom cilja je da klasifikuju tekstualne slučajeve iz predviđenih klasa i povećavaju nevidljive klase. Većina postojećih metoda se loše generalizuje pošto su naučeni parametri optimalni samo za viđene klase, a ne za oba klasa, a parametri su stativni u predviđanju procedura. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, predlažemo roman naučiti prilagoditi mrežu (LTA) koristeći varijantni metanaučni okvir. Posebno, LTA vozi adaptivnu klasifikatoru koristeći i vidljive i virtualne nevidljive klase kako bi simulirao generalizovani scenarij učenja nule snimanja (GZSL) u skladu sa testnim vremenom, i istovremeno uči da kalibriraju prototipe klase i predstave uzoraka kako bi naučeni parametri prilagođeni dolazećim nevidljivim klasama. Tvrdimo da je predloženi model sposoban da predstavlja sve prototipe i uzorke iz oba klasa do konsekvencije distribucije u globalnom prostoru. Eksperimenti na pet grupa podataka za klasifikaciju teksta pokazuju da naš model iznosi nekoliko konkurentnih prethodnih pristupa velikim marginama. Kod i cijele podatke su dostupne na https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'sv': 'Generaliserad textklassificering syftar till att klassificera textinstanser från både tidigare sedda klasser och stegvis framväxande osedda klasser. De flesta befintliga metoderna generaliserar dåligt eftersom de lärda parametrarna endast är optimala för sedda klasser snarare än för båda klasserna, och parametrarna håller sig stilla i förutsägelseförfaranden. För att ta itu med dessa utmaningar föreslår vi ett nytt LTA-nätverk med hjälp av en variant meta-lärande ramverk. Specifikt tränar LTA en adaptiv klassificering genom att använda både sedda och virtuella osedda klasser för att simulera ett generaliserat zero-shot lärande (GZSL) scenario i enlighet med testtiden, och lär sig samtidigt att kalibrera klassprototyperna och provrepresentationerna för att göra de lärda parametrarna anpassningsbara till inkommande osedda klasser. Vi hävdar att den föreslagna modellen kan representera alla prototyper och prover från båda klasserna till en mer konsekvent fördelning i ett globalt rum. Omfattande experiment på fem textklassificeringsdatauppsättningar visar att vår modell överträffar flera konkurrensutsatta tidigare tillvägagångssätt med stora marginaler. Koden och hela datauppsättningen finns tillgängliga på https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය ශූන්ය- ශූන්ය පාළුවක් විශේෂණය අදහස් කරනවා පස්සේ දැක්ක පාළුවක් වලින් පාළුවක් වලින් පාළුව ගොඩක් විදියට තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට විශේෂ විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පමණික විදියට පමණික විදියට පමණික මේ අභ්\u200dයානයක් විදිහට ගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න (LTA) ජාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් භාවිත වෙනස් මෙටා ඉගෙන ගන් විශේෂයෙන්, LTA ක්\u200dරීන්ස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරවේශය ප්\u200dරවේශකය සහ අවසානය නොදන්න ප්\u200dරවේශකය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශකය ප්\u200dරවේශකය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ කාලය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ කාලය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශකය සඳහා පරීක්ෂකය අපි කියන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සියලුම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ සැමැලුම් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වලින් සාමා පාළුවන් විශේෂණ දත්ත සෙට් පස්සේ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් විශේ කෝඩ හා මුළු දත්ත සැට් අවස්ථාවයි. https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ta': 'பொதுவாக பூஜ்ஜியமாக்கப்பட்ட உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் நிகழ்வுகளை முன்னோடு பார்க்கப்பட்ட வகுப்புகளிலிருந்து வகுப்படுத்தும் மற்றும்  இருக்கும் வகுப்புகளுக்கு பதிலாக பார்க்கப்பட்ட அளபுருக்களுக்கு மட்டும் தான் விருப்பமாக இருக்கும் மற்றும் அளபுருக்கள் முன்னோட் இந்த சவால்களை முகவரிக்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய பிணையத்தை அடாப்ட் (LTA) வலைப்பின்னலில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், மாற Name நாம் நிரூபிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி அனைத்து முனைமாதிரி மற்றும் மாதிரிகளை இரண்டு வகுப்புகளில் இருந்தும் மாதிரிகளை குறிக்கும் என ஐந்து உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் தரவுத்தளங்களில் விரிவான சோதனைகள் பார்க்கிறது எங்கள் மாதிரி பெரிய ஓரங்கள் மூலம் பல போராடிய மு The code and the whole datasets are available at  https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ur': 'جنرائل صفر-شٹ ٹکسٹ کلاسی کا ارادہ ہے کہ پہلے دیکھے کلاس کے دونوں ٹکسٹ کی اینسٹس کو کلاسی کریں اور اضافہ طور پر غیر دیکھے کلاس سے اضافہ ہوتے ہیں. بہت سے موجود طریقے بدترین طریقے لگاتے ہیں کیونکہ علم پارامیٹر صرف دیکھے کلاس کے لئے بہترین ہیں، اور پارامیٹر پردازگاروں کی پیش بینی میں ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں. ان چالوں کے بارے میں ہم نے ایک روانی سیکھنے کی پیغام دی ہے کہ (LTA) نیٹ ورک کو اڈپٹ کرے۔ مخصوص طور پر، LTA ٹرین ایک اڈپٹیٹ کلیسٹر کو دکھائے جاتے ہیں، دیکھے ہوئے اور مجارسول غیر دیکھے کلاس کے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک عمومی صفر शॉٹ سیناریو (GZSL) سیناریو کو آزمائش زمان کے مطابق سینالیٹ کریں، اور ایک دفعہ کلاس پروٹیپ اور نمونہ نمونہ نمونہ نمونہ کے مطابق سکھاتے ہیں کہ سک ہم کہتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد مدل تمام پروٹوٹیپ اور نمونے دونوں کلاس سے ایک گروئیل فضا میں زیادہ موافق تقسیم کرنے کے لئے قادر ہے۔ پانچ ٹیکسٹ کلاسپیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ پر پھیلا ہوا آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل بہت سی مسابقات کی پہلے آزمائش کو بڑی سمندر کے ذریعہ نکالتا ہے۔ کوڈ اور تمام ڈاٹ سٹ موجود ہیں https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis To address these challenges, we propose a novel Learn to Adapt (LTA) network using a variant meta-learning framework.  @ info Biz murakkab qilingan modeli ikkita sinfdagi hamma protokollar va misollarni ko'rsatish mumkin, dunyo bo'ylab boʻsh joy bilan bir qanday ajratish mumkin. 5 matn classification maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kengaytirish imtiyozlari esa modelmiz katta marginlar bilan bir nechta rivojlanadigan bir xil usullarni bajaradi. Kodlash va hamma maʼlumot satri mavjud emas https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'vi': 'Chế độ phân loại văn bản không bắn rộng lớn nhằm phân loại các trường hợp văn bản từ cả hai lớp được nhìn thấy trước và các lớp không bị phát triển. Hầu hết các phương pháp đã sử dụng không tốt, vì các thông số học được chỉ phù hợp với các lớp nhìn chứ không phải cho cả hai lớp, và các tham số vẫn cố định trong các thủ tục dự đoán. Để đối phó với những thử thách này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng truyền hình "Học cách thích nghi (LTO) sử dụng một bộ chế biến dị học. Đặc biệt, độ phân loại thích hợp được tạo ra bằng cách sử dụng cả lớp không bị phát hiện lẫn ảo để mô phỏng kịch bản học bắn không Chung theo thời gian thử nghiệm, và đồng thời học hiệu chỉnh các mô hình phân loại hạng học để biến các tham số học theo các lớp vô hình. Chúng tôi khẳng định kiểu mẫu được đề nghị có khả năng đại diện tất cả các mẫu và mẫu từ cả hai lớp cho một sự phân phối bền vững hơn trong một không gian to àn cầu. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ trên năm bộ dữ liệu phân loại văn bản cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta vượt trội hơn nhiều phương pháp cạnh tranh trước với diện mạo lớn. Mật mã và toàn bộ bộ dữ liệu có sẵn ở https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'bg': 'Общата класификация на текст с нулев изстрел цели класифициране на текстови инстанции както от видени преди това класове, така и от постепенно възникващи невидими класове. Повечето съществуващи методи се обобщават слабо, тъй като научените параметри са оптимални само за наблюдаваните класове, а не за двата класа, а параметрите остават неподвижни в прогнозиращите процедури. За да се справим с тези предизвикателства, предлагаме нова мрежа "Научи се да адаптираш", използваща вариантна рамка за метаобучение. По-конкретно, обучава адаптивен класификатор, като използва както видими, така и виртуални невидими класове, за да симулира сценарий на генерализирано нулево обучение (ГZSL) в съответствие с времето на теста, и едновременно се научава да калибрира прототипите на класа и образцовите изображения, за да направи научените параметри адаптивни към входящите невидими класове. Твърдим, че предложеният модел е способен да представи всички прототипи и проби от двата класа до по-последователно разпределение в глобално пространство. Обширни експерименти с пет набора данни за класификация на текста показват, че нашият модел надминава няколко конкурентни предишни подхода с големи маржове. Кодът и всички набори от данни са достъпни на адрес: https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'nl': 'De algemene zero-shot tekstclassificatie is bedoeld om tekstuele instanties te classificeren van zowel eerder gezien klassen als incrementele opkomende onzichtbare klassen. De meeste bestaande methoden generaliseren slecht omdat de geleerde parameters alleen optimaal zijn voor zichtbare klassen in plaats van voor beide klassen, en de parameters stilstaan bij het voorspellen van procedures. Om deze uitdagingen aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw Learn to Adapt (LTA) netwerk voor met behulp van een variant meta-learning framework. Met name traint LTA een adaptieve classificator door zowel zichtbare als virtuele onzichtbare klassen te gebruiken om een generaliseerd zero-shot learning (GZSL) scenario te simuleren in overeenstemming met de testtijd, en leert tegelijkertijd om de klasseprotypen en voorbeeldrepresentaties te kalibreren om de geleerde parameters adaptief te maken aan inkomende onzichtbare klassen. We beweren dat het voorgestelde model in staat is om alle prototypes en monsters uit beide klassen weer te geven tot een consistentere verdeling in een globale ruimte. Uitgebreide experimenten met vijf tekstclassificatiedatasets tonen aan dat ons model meerdere concurrerende eerdere benaderingen met grote marges overtreft. De code en de hele datasets zijn beschikbaar op: https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'da': 'Generaliseret tekstklassifikation har til formål at klassificere tekstforekomster fra både tidligere set klasser og gradvist fremkommende usynlige klasser. De fleste eksisterende metoder generaliserer dårligt, da de lærte parametre kun er optimale for set klasser snarere end for begge klasser, og parametrene holder stationære i forudsigelsesprocedurer. For at løse disse udfordringer foreslår vi et nyt LTA-netværk ved hjælp af en variant meta-læringsramme. Specielt træner LTA en adaptiv klassificering ved at bruge både set og virtuelle usynlige klasser til at simulere et generaliseret zero-shot learning (GZSL) scenarie i overensstemmelse med testtiden, og samtidig lærer at kalibrere klassens prototyper og prøverepræsentationer for at gøre de lærte parametre adaptive til indgående usynlige klasser. Vi hævder, at den foreslåede model er i stand til at repræsentere alle prototyper og prøver fra begge klasser til en mere ensartet fordeling i et globalt rum. Omfattende eksperimenter med fem tekstklassifikationsdatasæt viser, at vores model overgår flere konkurrencedygtige tidligere tilgange med store marginer. Koden og hele datasættet er tilgængelige på https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'hr': 'Generalizirana klasifikacija teksta od nule snimke cilja je klasifikirati tekstualne slučajeve od prethodnih viđenih klasa i povećavajući nevidljivih klasa. Većina postojećih metoda se loše generalizira jer su naučeni parametri optimalni samo za vidne klase nego za oba klasa, a parametri drže stativne u predviđanju postupka. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, predlažemo novu nauku prilagoditi mrežu (LTA) koristeći varijantni okvir metaučenja. Posebno, LTA vozi adaptivnu klasifikaciju koristeći i vidljive i virtualne nevidljive klase kako bi simulirali generalizirani scenarij učenja nula snimanja (GZSL) u skladu s testnim vremenom, te istovremeno uči kalibraciju prototipa klase i predstavljanja uzoraka kako bi učeni parametri prilagođeni dolazeći nevidljivim klasama. Tvrdimo da je predloženi model sposoban predstavljati sve prototipe i uzorke iz obje klase do konsekvencije distribucije u globalnom prostoru. Prošireni eksperimenti na pet podataka klasifikacije teksta pokazuju da naš model iznosi nekoliko konkurentnih prethodnih pristupa velikim marginama. Kod i cijele podatke su dostupne na https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'de': 'Die generalisierte Null-Schuss-Textklassifizierung zielt darauf ab, Textinstanzen sowohl aus zuvor gesehenen Klassen als auch inkrementell auftauchenden unsichtbaren Klassen zu klassifizieren. Die meisten existierenden Methoden verallgemeinern schlecht, da die erlernten Parameter nur für gesehene Klassen und nicht für beide Klassen optimal sind und die Parameter bei der Vorhersage von Prozeduren stationär bleiben. Um diese Herausforderungen anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neuartiges Learn to Adapt (LTA)-Netzwerk vor, das ein variantenreiches Meta-Learning-Framework verwendet. Insbesondere trainiert LTA einen adaptiven Klassifikator, indem er sowohl gesehene als auch virtuelle unsichtbare Klassen verwendet, um ein generalisiertes Null-Schuss-Lernen (GZSL)-Szenario entsprechend der Testzeit zu simulieren und gleichzeitig lernt, die Klassenprototypen und Beispieldarstellungen zu kalibrieren, um die erlernten Parameter an eingehende unsichtbare Klassen anzupassen. Wir behaupten, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell in der Lage ist, alle Prototypen und Proben aus beiden Klassen zu einer konsistenteren Verteilung in einem globalen Raum darzustellen. Umfangreiche Experimente an fünf Textklassifizierungsdatensätzen zeigen, dass unser Modell mehrere wettbewerbsfähige bisherige Ansätze um große Margen übertrifft. Der Code und die gesamten Datensätze sind verfügbar unter https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'id': 'Klasifikasi teks nol ditembak umum bermaksud untuk mengklasifikasi instansi teks dari kedua kelas yang sebelumnya terlihat dan kelas yang tidak terlihat secara incremental muncul. Most existing methods generalize poorly since the learned parameters are only optimal for seen classes rather than for both classes, and the parameters keep stationary in predicting procedures.  Untuk mengatasi tantangan-tantangan ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah jaringan belajar untuk menyesuaikan (LTA) dengan menggunakan rangkaian meta-belajar varian. Secara spesifik, LTA melatih klassifikasi adaptif dengan menggunakan kedua kelas yang terlihat dan virtual yang tidak terlihat untuk simulasi skenario belajar nol tembakan (GZSL) secara umum sesuai dengan waktu ujian, dan secara bersamaan belajar untuk mengkalibrasi prototip kelas dan persembahan sampel untuk membuat parameter belajar adaptif untuk kelas yang tidak terlihat masuk. Kami mengklaim bahwa model yang diusulkan mampu mewakili semua prototip dan sampel dari kedua kelas ke distribusi yang lebih konsisten dalam ruang global. Eksperimen ekstensif pada lima set data klasifikasi teks menunjukkan bahwa model kita melampaui beberapa pendekatan kompetitif sebelumnya dengan margin besar. Kode dan seluruh set data tersedia di https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'fa': 'ترکیب متن صفر تصویر ژنرالی را هدف می\u200cدهد که موارد متن را از کلاس\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی و کلاس\u200cهای غیب\u200cبینی به طور اضافه\u200cای تشکیل دهد. بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود بد ترکیب می\u200cکنند، زیرا پارامترهای یاد گرفته فقط برای کلاس\u200cهای دیده\u200cشده\u200cاند، به جای هر دو کلاس، و پارامترها در پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی ثابت می\u200cکنند. برای حل این چالش\u200cها، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک روزنامه یاد بگیریم تا شبکه (LTA) را با استفاده از چهارچوب یادگیری مته\u200cای تغییر دهیم. مخصوصاً LTA با استفاده از کلاس\u200cهای دیده و مجازی غیر دیده\u200cای برای شبیه سازی یک سناریو یادگیری صفر (GZSL) عمومی با زمان آزمایش آموزش می\u200cدهد، و همزمان یاد می\u200cگیرد که پروتویپ کلاس و نمونه\u200cهای نمونه\u200cها را کالیبرار کند تا پارامترهای یاد گرفته\u200cاند به کلاس\u200cهای غیر دیده\u200cای آماده کنند. ما ادعا می\u200cکنیم که این مدل پیشنهاد قادر است که همه نمونه\u200cهای پروتتایپ و نمونه\u200cها از هر دو کلاس به یک توزیع پایه\u200cتری در فضا جهانی نمایش دهد. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای روی پنج تنظیم داده\u200cهای مختصات متن نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما چند تنظیم پیشینیان را با مرز بزرگ انجام می\u200cدهد. کد و تمام مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها در دسترس هستند https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'sw': 'Ufanuzi wa maandishi yasiyo na risasi ya ujumla unakusudia kutangaza matukio ya kimsingi kutoka kwa darasa zote zilizoonekana hapo awali na kuongezeka kwa darasa zisizo na siri. Most existing methods generalize poorly since the learned parameters are only optimal for seen classes rather than for both classes, and the parameters keep stationary in predicting procedures.  Ili kukabiliana na changamoto hizi, tunapendekeza kujifunza riwaya kwa Mtandao wa Adapt (LTA) kwa kutumia mfumo mbadala wa kujifunza kwa meta. Kwa ujumla, LTA inamfundisha mwandishi wa a in a inayofanana kwa kutumia darasa zote zinazoonekana na visivyo visivyofichikana kwa ajili ya kuelezea hali ya kujifunza sifuri (GZSL) kwa mujibu wa wakati wa jaribio, na kwa wakati mwingine wanajifunza kupata mifano ya darasa na maonesho ya sampuli ili kufanya parameters wanazojifunza kuwa na uhakika wa kuingia darasa zisizo fichikana. Tunaidai kuwa muundo wa pendekezo una uwezo wa kuwawakilisha mifano na sampuli zote kutoka darasa zote hadi usambazaji wa kawaida katika anga la dunia. Majaribio mengi kwenye takwimu za usambazaji wa maandishi mitano yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unafanya mbinu kadhaa za kushindana na viwanja vikubwa vya awali. Kodi na seti zote za data zinapatikana katika https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ko': '광의의 제로 렌즈 텍스트 분류의 목적은 이전에 보았던 클래스와 점차적으로 나타난 보이지 않는 클래스 중의 텍스트 실례를 분류하는 것이다.기존의 대다수 방법은 범화 능력이 비교적 떨어진다. 왜냐하면 학습하는 매개 변수는 SEED류가 아니라 두 가지 모두 가장 우수하고 예측 과정에서 매개 변수가 안정적이기 때문이다.이러한 도전에 대응하기 위해 우리는 새로운 학습적응(LTA) 네트워크를 제기했는데 이것은 변체원 학습 구조를 사용한다.구체적으로 LTA는 가시 클래스와 가상 보이지 않는 클래스를 사용하여 자체 적응 분류기를 훈련시켜 테스트 시간에 따라 광의 제로포 학습(GZSL) 장면을 모의하고 교정 클래스의 원형과 샘플 표시를 학습하여 학습의 파라미터가 들어오는 보이지 않는 클래스에 적응하도록 한다.우리는 제시된 모델이 두 가지 유형 중의 모든 원형과 견본을 전 세계 공간에서 더욱 일치하는 분포를 나타낼 수 있다고 주장한다.다섯 개의 텍스트 분류 데이터 집합에서 대량의 실험을 통해 우리의 모델은 이전의 몇 가지 경쟁력 있는 방법보다 큰 우위를 가진다는 것을 알 수 있다.코드와 전체 데이터 집합은https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'tr': 'Umumy s철zba힊y 0-resim metin klasifikasyny 철흫ki g철r첵채n klaslardan hem tekst synplaryny klasifikasynda alyp bar첵ar. I흫 k철p bar d철w체rler, 철wrenmeli parametreler di흫e g철r체len klaslar 체챌in optimaldyr, we parametreler hem synplar 체챌in durarlydyr. Bu kyn챌ylyklary 챌철zmek 체챌in, biz bir roman 철wrenmek 체챌in (LTA) sy첵alany meta-철wrenmek 챌er챌evesini ulanarak 철wred첵채ris. Adat챌a, LTA testi흫 wagtyna g철r채 g철r체n첵채n we wirtual g철rm채n synplary ulanyp adaptiv klassifikat챌y testi흫 wagtyna g철r채 d철redilen 0-aty 철wrenmesini s체첵힊irmek 체챌in, we simullerde synp prototiplerini we 철rneklerini kalibrlemek 체챌in 철wren첵채n parameterleri g철r체nm채n synplara adaptiv etmek 체챌in 철wren첵채r. Biz teklip eden nusgy흫 hemme prototip we 철rneklerini d체n첵채d채ki 첵erlerde bir da첵ratyn etm채ge m체mkin edip biljekdigini iddia edip bil첵채ris. Be힊 metin klasifikasyonatdaky 철r채n 챌arpy힊malar 체챌in 철r채n 챌arpy힊ykly 철흫ki gabdalyklary흫 birn채챌e d철wletlerinden ba힊ga 챌ykypdygyny g철rkez첵채r. _Mazmunlar https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'sq': "Klasifikimi i gjeneralizuar i tekstit zero-shot ka për qëllim klasifikimin e rasteve tekstuale nga klasat e parë më parë dhe nga klasat e padukshme në rritje. Shumica e metodave ekzistuese gjeneralizohen keq pasi parametrat e mësuar janë vetëm optimale për klasat e parë sesa për të dy klasat dhe parametrat mbeten të qëndrueshëm në procedurat parashikuese. Për t'i trajtuar këto sfida, ne propozojmë një rrjet të ri Mësimi për të Adaktuar (LTA) duke përdorur një kuadër variant meta-mësimi. Specifikisht, LTA trajnon një klasifikues adaptues duke përdorur si klasa të parë ashtu edhe klasa virtuale të padukshme për të simuluar një skenar të gjeneralizuar mësimi zero-shot (GZSL) në përputhje me kohën e testit dhe në të njëjtën kohë mëson të kalibrojë prototipet e klasës dhe përfaqësimet e mostrave për të bërë parametrat e mësuar adaptues ndaj klasave të padukshme të ardhshme. Ne pretendojmë se modeli i propozuar është i aftë të përfaqësojë të gjitha prototipat dhe mostrat nga të dy klasat në një shpërndarje më konsistente në një hapësirë globale. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në pesë grupe të dhënash të klasifikimit të tekstit tregojnë se modeli ynë mbizotëron disa qasje konkurruese të mëparshme me margine të mëdha. Kodi dhe të gjithë grupet e të dhënave janë në dispozicion në https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ክፍተት መግለጫ አስቀድሞ ከተመለከቱ ክፍሎች እና ተሳታፊ ክፍተቶችን ለማሳመር ይችላል፡፡ በሁለቱ ክፍሎች ይልቅ የተማሩ ተማሪዎቹ ክፍሎች ለመታወቂያ ብቻ ናቸው፡፡ እነዚህን ጥያቄዎች ለመቀበል፣ የተለየ መተማር ፍሬም በመጠቀም የአዳapt (LTA) መረብ ለመማር የመረጃ ጠቅላይ እናስጀምራለን፡፡ በተለያዩ ጊዜ LTA በተፈተናው ጊዜ የ0-shot ትምህርት (GZSL) ማስተማርን በመጠቀም እና በተማሪዎቹ ፕሮቶግራሞች እና ምሳሌዎችን ለማስተካከል ይማራሉ፡፡ We claim that the proposed model is capable of representing all prototypes and samples from both classes to a more consistent distribution in a global space.  በአምስት የጽሑፍ ክፍተት ዳታዎችን ላይ የሚጨምሩ ፈተናዎች ሞዴሌዎቻችን በብዙ አካባቢ ክፍል ሲያሳያል፡፡ የኮድ እና የዳታ ሰርቨሮች በ https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'hy': 'Ընդհանուր զրոյի տեքստի դասակարգման նպատակն է դասակարգել նախկինում տեսած դասերից և անտեսված դասերից: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների մեծամասնությունը վատ է ընդհանրացվում, քանի որ սովորված պարամետրերը միայն օպտիմալ են տեսանելի դասերի համար, ոչ թե երկու դասերի համար, և պարամետրերը կայուն են կանխատեսելու գործընթացներում: Այս մարտահրավերներին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր սովորել հարմարեցնել (LTA) ցանցը օգտագործելով տարբեր մետասովորելու շրջանակներ: Հատկապես, LTA-ն վարժեցնում է ադապտիվ դասակարգիչը՝ օգտագործելով տեսանելի և վիրտուալ անտեսանելի դասեր, որպեսզի սիմուլյացվի ընդհանուր զրո-կրակային ուսումնասիրության (GZSla) սցենարիան, ըստ փորձարկումների ժամանակի, և միաժամանակ սովորում է դասակարգի կալիբրացնել դասակարգի նախատիպերը և նմուշ Մենք պնդում ենք, որ առաջարկված մոդելը կարողանում է ներկայացնել երկու դասարանների բոլոր նախատիպերը և նմուշները ավելի համապատասխանատու տարածման համար գլոբալ տարածքում: Հինգ տեքստի դասակարգման տվյալների հիմնական փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը հաջողվում է մի քանի մրցակցության նախորդ մոտեցումների վրա մեծ արժեքներով: Կոդը և ամբողջ տվյալների համակարգերը հասանելի են https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'af': "Gegenereereerde nul- skoot teks klassifikasie doel om teks voorbeelde te klassifiseer van beide voorheen gesien klasse en inkrementeer ontsiende klasse. Die mees bestaande metodes genereer baie, omdat die geleerde parameters slegs optimal is vir gesien klasse eerder as vir beide klasse, en die parameters hou staatiewe in voorskou prosedure. Om hierdie uitdagings te adres, voorstel ons 'n novel Leer om aan te pas (LTA) netwerk te gebruik met 'n variante meta-leer raamwerk. Spesifieke, LTA trein 'n adaptief klassifiseerder deur beide gesien en virtuele ongesiende klasse te gebruik om 'n generelliseerde nulskoot leer (GZSL) scenario te simuleer in ooreenkomstig met die toets tyd, en simulatief leer om die klas prototipes en voorbeeld verteenwoordings te kalibreer om die geleerde parameters adaptief te maak na inkom ongesiende klasse. Ons antwoord dat die voorgestelde model is in staat om alle prototipes en voorbeelde te verteenwoordig van beide klasse na 'n meer konsistente verspreiding in 'n globale spasie. Name Die kode en die hele datastel is beskikbaar by https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী দেখা গেছে ক্লাস থেকে ক্লাস এবং অদৃশ্য ক্লাসের মধ্যে প্রকাশিত টেক্সচুয়াল ইনসেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের উদ্দেশ্য। বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি খারাপ সাধারণ করে যেহেতু শিক্ষিত প্যারামিটার দুই শ্রেণীর পরিবর্তে দেখা হয়েছে কেবল অপারেশনের জন্য, আর প্যারা To address these challenges, we propose a novel Learn to Adapt (LTA) network using a variant meta-learning framework.  বিশেষ করে, এলটিএ দেখা এবং ভার্চুয়াল অদৃশ্য ক্লাস ব্যবহার করে একটি জেনারেলিয়াল শিক্ষার (জিজিএসএল) সিমেন্টারি করে প্রশিক্ষণ দেয়, এবং একই সাথে শিক্ষা দেয় ক্লাসের প্রোটোটোটাইপ এবং নমুনাল প্রতিনিধির আমরা দাবি করি যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল প্রতিনিধিত্ব করতে পারে এই দুই শ্রেণীর থেকে বিশ্ব জায়গায় বিতরণের জন্য। পাঁচটি টেক্সট ক্লাস্ফিকেশন ডাটাসেটে বিশাল পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল বিশাল প্রতিযোগিতায় বিভিন্ন প্রা কোড এবং পুরো ডাটাসেট পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'az': 'Sıfır-fırlat metin klasifikasyonu əvvəl gördüyü sınıflardan və daha böyük görünməyən sınıflardan məlumatları seçmək niyyətindədir. Ən çox mövcuddur metodlar, öyrənmiş parametrlər yalnız görünən sınıflar üçün optimaldır, iki sınıf yerinə, və parametrlər tədbirli prosedürlərdə durarlar. Bu çətinliklərdən çəkinmək üçün yeni bir məlumat öyrənmək üçün (LTA) a ğı ilə dəyişiklik meta öyrənmək fərqli vasitəsilə adapt etməyi təklif edirik. Özellikle, LTA sınama vaxtı ilə görünməyən və virtual dəstələri istifadə edərək hər ikisini görünməyən və görünməyən dəstələri istifadə edərək sıfırlı sıfırlı öyrənmə senaryosu (GZSL) ilə simulatəşdirir, və bu dəstə dəstə prototiplərini və nümunə göstəricilərini kalibrləmək üçün öyrənir ki, öyrənməmiş parametrləri gəlməz dəstələrə uyğunla Biz təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərin hər iki sınıftan və nümunələrini küresel bir yer içində daha müəyyən bir dağıtıma göstərməyə qadir olduğunu iddia edirik. Beş metin klasifikasiya veri qurularında geniş eksperimentlər modellərimizin böyük çərdələr ilə çoxlu müqayisədə əvvəlki tərəflərdən çoxlu tərəflərdən üstün olduğunu göstərər. Kod və bütün veri qurğuları https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'bs': 'Generalizirana klasifikacija teksta od nule snimke cilja je klasifikirati tekstualne slučajeve od predviđenih klasa i povećavajući nevidljivih klasa. Većina postojećih metoda se loše generalizuje jer su naučeni parametri optimalni samo za vidne klase, a ne za oba klasa, a parametri su stativni u predviđanju procedura. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, predlažemo roman naučiti prilagoditi mrežu (LTA) koristeći variantni metaučenjeni okvir. Posebno, LTA vozi adaptivnu klasifikaciju koristeći i vidljive i virtualne nevidljive klase kako bi simulirao generalizirani scenarij učenja nula snimanja (GZSL) u skladu s testnim vremenom, te istovremeno uči da kalibriraju prototipe klase i predstave uzoraka kako bi učeni parametri prilagodili dolazeći nevidljivim klasama. Tvrdimo da je predloženi model sposoban da predstavlja sve prototipe i uzorke iz oba klasa do konsekvencije distribucije u globalnom prostoru. Eksperimenti na pet podataka klasifikacije teksta pokazuju da naš model iznosi nekoliko konkurentnih prethodnih pristupa velikim marginama. Kod i cijele podatke su dostupne na https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'cs': 'Obecná nulová klasifikace textu se snaží klasifikovat textové instance z dříve viděných tříd i postupně vznikajících neviditelných tříd. Většina existujících metod zobecňuje špatně, protože učené parametry jsou optimální pouze pro viděné třídy, nikoli pro obě třídy, a parametry zůstávají stacionární při predikci postupů. Pro řešení těchto výzev navrhujeme novou síť Learn to Adapt (LTA) pomocí variantního meta-learningového frameworku. Konkrétně LTA trénuje adaptivní klasifikátor pomocí viděných i virtuálních neviditelných tříd k simulaci zobecněného scénáře nulového učení (GZSL) v souladu s testovací dobou a současně se učí kalibrovat prototypy tříd a reprezentace vzorků tak, aby byly naučené parametry adaptivní na příchozí neviditelné třídy. Tvrdíme, že navržený model je schopen reprezentovat všechny prototypy a vzorky z obou tříd k konzistentnějšímu rozložení v globálním prostoru. Rozsáhlé experimenty na pěti textových klasifikačních datových sadách ukazují, že náš model překonává několik konkurenčních předchozích přístupů o velké marže. Kód a celé datové sady jsou k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ca': "La classificació generalitzada de textos amb fotografies zero té l'objectiu de classificar instances textuals de les classes previament vistes i de les classes incrementalment emergents no vistes. La majoria dels mètodes existents s'generalitzen malament, perquè els paràmetres aprenguts són només optims per les classes vistes en comptes de les dues classes, i els paràmetres estacionen en els procediments de predicció. Per abordar aquests reptes, proposem una nova xarxa d'aprenentatge a adaptar (LTA) utilitzant un marc variant de meta-aprenentatge. Concretament, LTA treina un classificador adaptador utilitzant tant classes vistes com virtuals invisibles per simular un escenari generalitzat d'aprenentatge de fotografies zero (GZSL) d'acord amb el temps de prova, i al mateix temps aprenent a calibrar els prototips de classe i les representacions de mostres per adaptar els paràmetres aprenguts a les classes invisibles entrants. We claim that the proposed model is capable of representing all prototypes and samples from both classes to a more consistent distribution in a global space.  Els extensos experiments en cinc conjunts de dades de classificació de textos mostren que el nostre model supera diversos enfocaments competitius anteriors per grans marxes. El codi i tots els conjunts de dades estan disponibles https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'et': 'Üldine nullpildi teksti klassifikatsioon on suunatud nii varem nähtud klasside kui ka järk-järgult tekkivate nähtamatute klasside tekstieksemplaride klasside klassifitseerimisele. Enamik olemasolevaid meetodeid üldistatakse halvasti, kuna õppitud parameetrid on optimaalsed ainult nähtud klassidele, mitte mõlemale klassile, ja parameetrid jäävad prognoosimisprotseduuride seisma. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja uudse Learn to Adapt (LTA) võrgu, mis kasutab metaõppe raamistikku. Täpsemalt koolitab LTA adaptiivset klassifikaatorit, kasutades nii nähtud kui ka virtuaalseid nähtamatuid klasse, et simuleerida üldist null-shot õppe stsenaariumi (GZSL) vastavalt katseajale, ning õpib samaaegselt kalibreerima klassi prototüüpe ja näidisesitusi, et muuta õppitud parameetrid kohanduvaks sissetulevate nähtamatute klassidega. Väidame, et kavandatud mudel on võimeline esindama kõiki prototüüpe ja proove mõlemast klassist ühtlasemaks jaotuseks globaalses ruumis. Laiaulatuslikud eksperimendid viie teksti klassifitseerimise andmekogumiga näitavad, et meie mudel ületab suurte marginaalidega mitmeid konkurentsivõimelisi varasemaid lähenemisviise. Kood ja kogu andmekogum on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'fi': 'Yleisellä nollakuvatekstiluokituksella pyritään luokittelemaan tekstiesiintymiä sekä aiemmin nähtyistä luokista että asteittain nousevista näkymättömistä luokista. Useimmat olemassa olevat menetelmät yleistyvät huonosti, koska opitut parametrit ovat optimaalisia vain nähtyille luokille eikä molemmille luokille, ja parametrit pysyvät paikallaan ennustusmenettelyissä. Näiden haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta Learn to Adapt (LTA) -verkostoa, joka käyttää muunneltua meta-oppimiskehystä. Tarkemmin sanottuna LTA kouluttaa adaptiivista luokittelijaa käyttämällä sekä nähtyjä että virtuaalisia näkymättömiä luokkia simuloimaan yleistä nollakuvausta (GZSL) -skenaariota testiajan mukaisesti ja samalla oppii kalibroimaan luokan prototyyppejä ja näyteesityksiä, jotta opitut parametrit mukautuisivat tuleviin näkymättömiin luokkiin. Väitämme, että ehdotettu malli pystyy edustamaan kaikkia prototyyppejä ja näytteitä molemmista luokista yhdenmukaisempaan jakautumiseen globaalissa tilassa. Laajat kokeet viidellä tekstiluokitteluaineistolla osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu suurilla marginaaleilla useasta aikaisemmasta kilpailukykyisestä lähestymistavasta. Koodi ja koko aineisto ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'he': 'מסגרת טקסט אפס-צילום כללית מטורפת להקליף מקרים טקסטאליים משני השיעורים שנראו קודם לכן ושיעורים בלתי נראים מתפתחות באופן שלילי. רוב השיטות הקיומות מתפשטות גרוע מכיוון שהפרמטרים הלימודים אופטימיים רק לשיעורים ראויים במקום לשני השיעורים, והפרמטרים ממשיכים לעמוד בתהליך חיזוי. כדי להתמודד עם האתגרים האלה, אנו מציעים רומן ללמוד להתאים (LTA) רשת בשימוש מסגרת מטה-לימוד שונה. במיוחד, LTA מאמן מסווג מתאים על ידי השימוש בשיעורים ראויים וירטואליים בלתי ראויים כדי להדמייל תרחיש לימוד אפס-יריות (GZSL) כללי בהתאם לזמן הבדיקה, ולמד באותו הזמן לקליבר את אבטיפוסי השיעורים ולייצוג דגימות כדי לגרום לפרמטרים הלימודים להתאים לשיעורים בלתי ראויים נכנסים. אנו טוענים שהמודל המוצע מסוגל לייצג את כל אבטיפוסים ודגימות משני הכיתות לפיתוח קבוע יותר בחלל גלובלי. ניסויים רחבים על חמישה קבוצות נתונים מסווגים טקסטים מראים שהמודל שלנו עולה על כמה גישות קודמות תחרותיות על ידי שווים גדולים. הקוד וכל קבוצת הנתונים זמינות ב https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་Zero-shot་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་བ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་ཡིག་རྟགས་དང་འགྱུར་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ Most existing methods generalize poorly since the learned parameters are only optimal for seen classes rather than for both classes, and the parameters keep stationary in predicting procedures. གདོང་ལེན་འདི་དག་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོད་ཅིག་སྤྲོད་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Specifically, LTA trains an adaptive classifier by using both seen and virtual unseen classes to simulate a generalized zero-shot learning (GZSL) scenario in accordance with the test time, and simultaneously learns to calibrate the class prototypes and sample representations to make the learned parameters adaptive to incoming unseen classes. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་རྣམས་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ལས་འ རང་གི་མིག་རྩལ སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་གནད་སྡུད་ཚང་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདི་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'sk': 'Splošna ničelna klasifikacija besedila je namenjena klasifikaciji besedilnih primerov iz predhodno videnih razredov in postopoma nastajajočih nevidnih razredov. Večina obstoječih metod se slabo posploši, saj so učeni parametri optimalni le za vidne razrede in ne za obe razredi, parametri pa ostanejo mirni pri napovedovanju postopkov. Za reševanje teh izzivov predlagamo novo omrežje Learn to Adapt (LTA), ki uporablja različico metaučnega okvira. Zlasti LTA usposablja prilagodljivi klasifikator z uporabo vidnih in virtualnih nevidnih razredov za simuliranje scenarija splošnega učenja brez strela (GZSL) v skladu s preskusnim časom, hkrati pa se nauči kalibrirati prototipe razreda in vzorčne predstavitve, da bi se naučeni parametri prilagodili prihodnim nevidnim razredom. Trdimo, da je predlagani model sposoben predstaviti vse prototipe in vzorce iz obeh razredov do doslednejše porazdelitve v globalnem prostoru. Obsežni poskusi s petimi nabori podatkov o klasifikaciji besedil kažejo, da naš model z velikimi robovi presega več konkurenčnih prejšnjih pristopov. Koda in celotni nabori podatkov so na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.', 'ha': "Ana jarraba sifilafin matsayin na sifilacce na sifilacce don ya yi amfani da su rarraba shiryoyin ayuka na zaman darafõfi da ke ci-gaba. Babu ƙidãyayyuta wanda ke jira, za'a zartar da shi mai rauni, kwani parameteri da aka lũra su zama mafiya amfani kawai ga fasalar da aka gane su, kuma don su kiyaye fasalin, kuma da parameters, sai su tsare stationary a cikin jarayon bayani. To, in bayyana wa waɗannan tsummõmi, muna buƙata wani shirin Cire Gani zuwa Adaft (LTA) na ƙarani da wata firam mai daban meta-leari. A ƙayyade, LTA na kõre wani mai adapti game da ya yi amfani da su sami'ar da aka gane shi kuma runfafi masu basu'a na gaskiya dõmin ya ƙayyade wani sanarwa na da sifori (GZSL) da aka jarraba (GZSL) da lokacin jarraba, kuma a lokacin da aka sanar da su kalibarin misãlai na darafõfi da masu motsalar misãlai dõmin ya sami parameters da aka sanar su daidaita zuwa da za'a shiga darafõfi wanda ba'a sani ba. Tune faɗa cewa misalin da aka buɗe shi yana iya iya iya nuna duk misãlai da misãlai daga darafõfi biyu zuwa wani rabo mai daidai a cikin filin duniya. Cire masu shimfiɗa kan tsarin matsayin taƙaita tanã nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da wasu matsayi masu motsi da suka zaman ta sami-gaba. Koda da kodi da duk set na database za'a iya amfani da https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.", 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Piye perusahaan sing isih perusahaan kelas podho akeh dadi, dadi kapan kelas nang kelas sing apik dhéwé, dadi kapan kelas podho kejahake kelas karo kelas, lan parameters sediyang beraksi kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan. Mbok nganggo perbudhakan iki, kita mudhaya batir Learn to Adjust (LTA) network nggo sistem meta-Learn sampeyan. CURRENTCURRENT Awak dhéwé ngerti, akeh unéwangi model iso nggawe ning saben prototip lan samplin kelas kuwi kudu kelas telas nang saben tanggal kuwi tindakan sistem sing berarti barêng langgar. AllProgressBar Kod lan tambah dataset sing nesaturan https://github.com/Quareia/LTA.'}
{'en': 'Good Examples Make A Faster Learner: Simple Demonstration-based Learning for Low-resource ', 'ar': 'TableFormer: نمذجة محولات قوية لتشفير نص الجدول', 'pt': 'TableFormer: Modelagem de transformador robusta para codificação de texto de tabela', 'fr': 'TableFormer\xa0: modélisation robuste des transformateurs pour le codage de texte de table', 'es': 'TableFormer: modelado robusto de transformadores para la codificación de tablas de texto', 'ja': 'TableFormer:テーブルテキストエンコーディングのための堅牢な変圧器モデリング', 'hi': 'TableFormer: तालिका-पाठ एन्कोडिंग के लिए मजबूत ट्रांसफार्मर मॉडलिंग', 'zh': '表表单:以表文本编码鲁棒转换器建模', 'ru': 'TableFormer: Надежное моделирование трансформаторов для кодирования таблиц и текстов', 'ga': 'TableFormer: Samhaltú Trasfhoirmeoir Láidir le haghaidh Ionchódú Téacs Tábla', 'hu': 'TableFormer: Robusztus transzformĂ¡tor modellezĂ©s tĂ¡blĂ¡zatszĂ¶vegkĂ³dolĂ¡shoz', 'ka': 'ტაბლიFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'el': 'Ισχυρή μοντελοποίηση μετασχηματιστών για κωδικοποίηση πίνακα-κειμένου', 'it': 'TableFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table-Text Encoding', 'kk': 'КестеFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'lt': 'TableFormer: stiprus transformatoriaus modeliavimas lentelės teksto kodavimui', 'mk': 'Former: robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'ms': 'TableFormer: Modelan Penukar Kuat untuk Pengekodan Teks-Jadual', 'ml': 'Former: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'mn': 'ХүснэгтFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'mt': 'TabellaFormer: Mudellar robust tat-Trasformatur għall-Kodifikazzjoni tat-Test tat-Tabella', 'no': 'TabellFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'pl': 'TableFormer: solidne modelowanie transformatora dla kodowania tabeli-tekstu', 'ro': 'TableFormer: Modelare robustă a transformatorului pentru codificarea tabelului-text', 'sr': 'TableFormer: robust transformer model for table- text encoding', 'so': 'Former: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table-Text Encoding', 'sv': 'TableFormer: Robust transformatormodellering för tabelltextkodning', 'si': 'ටේබ්ල්', 'ta': 'அட்டவணைFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'ur': 'تابلیFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'uz': 'Former: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'vi': 'Máy biến hình bền cho Bảng mã hóa Văn bản Bàn', 'bg': 'TableFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'da': 'TableFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table-Text Encoding', 'nl': 'TableFormer: robuuste transformatiemodellering voor tabel-tekst codering', 'hr': 'TablicaFormer: Strog Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'de': 'TableFormer: Robuste Transformer-Modellierung für die Tabellentextkodierung', 'id': 'TableFormer: Modeling Transformer robust untuk Pengekodan Teks-Tabel', 'ko': 'TableFormer: 표 텍스트 인코딩을 위한 건장 변환기 모델링', 'fa': 'TableFormer: Modeling robust Transformer for Table- Text Encoding', 'tr': 'TäblerFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table-Text Encoding', 'sw': 'Former: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'sq': 'TableFormer: Modelimi i fortë i transformuesve për kodimin e tabelës-tekstit', 'af': 'OortjieFormer: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'am': 'Former: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'hy': 'Տաբերակ', 'az': 'TabeloFormer: Stroust Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'bn': 'টেবিল', 'bs': 'TablicaFormer: Strog Transformer Modeling for Table- Text Encoding', 'ca': 'TableFormer: Modell robust de transformació per codificació de textos de taula', 'et': 'TableFormer: tugev transformaatori modelleerimine tabeli- teksti kodeerimiseks', 'cs': 'TableFormer: Robustní modelování transformátoru pro kódování textu tabulky', 'fi': 'TableFormer: Kestävä muuntajan mallinnus taulukon tekstikoodausta varten', 'jv': 'File', 'sk': 'TableFormer: Robustno modeliranje transformatorjev za kodiranje tabele- besedila', 'he': 'TableFormer: Modelling robust Transformer for Table- Text Encoding', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་།Former: Robust Transformer Modeling for Table-Text Encoding', 'ha': 'Former: Robust Transformer Modelling for Table- Text Encodiing'}
{'en': 'Recent advances in prompt-based learning have shown strong results on few-shot text classification by using cloze-style templates.Similar attempts have been made on named entity recognition (NER) which manually design templates to predict entity types for every text span in a sentence. However, such methods may suffer from error propagation induced by entity span detection, high cost due to enumeration of all possible text spans, and omission of inter-dependencies among token labels in a sentence. Here we present a simple demonstration-based learning method for NER, which lets the input be prefaced by task demonstrations for in-context learning. We perform a systematic study on demonstration strategy regarding what to include (entity examples, with or without surrounding context), how to select the examples, and what templates to use. Results on in-domain learning and domain adaptation show that the model’s performance in low-resource settings can be largely improved with a suitable demonstration strategy (e.g., a 4-17% improvement on 25 train instances). We also find that good demonstration can save many labeled examples and consistency in demonstration contributes to better performance.', 'ar': 'يعد فهم الجداول جانبًا مهمًا من فهم اللغة الطبيعية. تتطلب النماذج الحالية لفهم الجدول التحويل الخطي لهيكل الجدول ، حيث يتم ترميز ترتيب الصفوف أو العمود على أنه تحيز غير مرغوب فيه. مثل هذه التحيزات الزائفة تجعل النموذج عرضة لاضطرابات ترتيب الصفوف والأعمدة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، لم يقم العمل السابق بنمذجة هياكل الجدول أو محاذاة نص الجدول بشكل كامل ، مما يعيق القدرة على فهم نص الجدول. في هذا العمل ، نقترح TableFormer قويًا ومدركًا هيكليًا لتشفير نص الجدول ، حيث يتم دمج التحيزات الهيكلية المجدولة بالكامل من خلال تحيزات الانتباه القابلة للتعلم. TableFormer (1) ثابت تمامًا لأوامر الصفوف والأعمدة ، و (2) يمكنه فهم الجداول بشكل أفضل بسبب التحيزات الاستقرائية الجدولية. أظهرت التقييمات التي أجريناها أن TableFormer يتفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس القوية في جميع الإعدادات على مجموعات بيانات جدول SQA و WTQ و TabFact ، ويحقق أداءً متطورًا في SQA ، خاصةً عند مواجهة اضطرابات الصفوف وترتيب العمود الثابتة (تحسن بنسبة 6٪ على أفضل خط أساس) ، لأن أداء طرز SOTA السابقة ينخفض بنسبة 4٪ - 6٪ عند مواجهة مثل هذه الاضطرابات بينما لا يتأثر TableFormer.', 'fr': "La compréhension des tableaux est un aspect important de la compréhension du langage naturel. Les modèles existants pour la compréhension des tables nécessitent la linéarisation de la structure du tableau, où l'ordre des lignes ou des colonnes est codé comme un biais indésirable. Ces biais parasites rendent le modèle vulnérable aux perturbations de l'ordre des lignes et des colonnes. En outre, les travaux antérieurs n'ont pas complètement modélisé les structures des tableaux ou les alignements de texte de tableau, ce qui nuit à la capacité de compréhension du texte du tableau. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une architecture d'encodage de texte de table TableFormer robuste et sensible à la structure, dans laquelle les biais structurels tabulaires sont complètement incorporés par des biais d'attention apprises. TableFormer est (1) strictement invariant aux ordres des lignes et des colonnes, et (2) pourrait mieux comprendre les tables en raison de ses biais inductifs tabulaires. Nos évaluations ont montré que TableFormer surpasse les valeurs de base solides dans tous les paramètres des ensembles de données de raisonnement de table SQA, WTQ et TabFact, et atteint des performances de pointe sur SQA, en particulier lorsqu'il est confronté à des perturbations d'ordre des lignes et des colonnes invariantes de réponse (amélioration de 6\xa0% par rapport à la meilleure base de référence), car Les performances des modèles SOTA précédents chutent de 4 à 6\xa0% lorsqu'ils sont confrontés à de telles perturbations alors que TableFormer n'est pas affecté.", 'es': 'La comprensión de las tablas es un aspecto importante de la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Los modelos existentes para la comprensión de tablas requieren la linealización de la estructura de la tabla, donde el orden de las filas o columnas se codifica como un sesgo no deseado. Estos sesgos falsos hacen que el modelo sea vulnerable a perturbaciones de orden de filas y columnas. Además, el trabajo anterior no ha modelado a fondo las estructuras de las tablas o las alineaciones del texto de la tabla, lo que dificulta la capacidad de comprensión del texto de la tabla. En este trabajo, proponemos una arquitectura de codificación de texto de tabla robusta y estructuralmente consciente TableFormer, donde los sesgos estructurales tabulares se incorporan completamente a través de sesgos de atención aprendibles. TableFormer es (1) estrictamente invariante para los pedidos de filas y columnas, y (2) podría entender mejor las tablas debido a sus sesgos inductivos tabulares. Nuestras evaluaciones mostraron que TableFormer supera a las sólidas líneas de base en todos los entornos de los conjuntos de datos de razonamiento de tablas SQA, WTQ y TabFact, y logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en SQA, especialmente cuando se enfrentan a perturbaciones de orden de filas y columnas invariantes en la respuesta (mejora del 6% con respecto a la mejor línea de base), porque El rendimiento de los modelos SOTA anteriores cae entre un 4% y un 6% cuando se enfrentan a tales perturbaciones, mientras que TableFormer no se ve afectado.', 'pt': 'Compreender as tabelas é um aspecto importante da compreensão da linguagem natural. Os modelos existentes para compreensão de tabelas requerem linearização da estrutura da tabela, onde a ordem das linhas ou colunas é codificada como um viés indesejado. Esses vieses espúrios tornam o modelo vulnerável a perturbações de ordem de linha e coluna. Além disso, trabalhos anteriores não modelaram completamente as estruturas de tabela ou alinhamentos de texto de tabela, dificultando a capacidade de compreensão de texto de tabela. Neste trabalho, propomos uma arquitetura de codificação de texto de tabela robusta e estruturalmente consciente TableFormer, onde vieses estruturais tabulares são incorporados completamente por meio de vieses de atenção apreensíveis. TableFormer é (1) estritamente invariável para ordens de linha e coluna e, (2) pode entender melhor as tabelas devido a seus vieses indutivos tabulares. Nossas avaliações mostraram que o TableFormer supera as linhas de base fortes em todas as configurações em conjuntos de dados de raciocínio de tabela SQA, WTQ e TabFact, e alcança desempenho de última geração em SQA, especialmente ao enfrentar perturbações de ordem de linha e coluna invariantes de resposta (melhoria de 6% em relação a a melhor linha de base), porque o desempenho dos modelos SOTA anteriores cai de 4% a 6% ao enfrentar tais perturbações enquanto o TableFormer não é afetado.', 'ja': '表を理解することは、自然言語理解の重要な側面です。 テーブルを理解するための既存のモデルは、行または列の順序が不要なバイアスとして符号化されるテーブル構造の線形化を必要とする。 このような偽のバイアスにより、モデルは行および列の順序摂動に対して脆弱になります。 さらに、以前の作業では、テーブル構造やテーブルテキストの配置を徹底的にモデル化しておらず、テーブルテキストの理解能力を妨げています。 この研究では、表形式の構造的バイアスが学習可能な注意バイアスを通じて完全に組み込まれる、堅牢で構造的に認識された表テキスト符号化アーキテクチャTableFormerを提案する。 TableFormerは、(1)行順序と列順序に厳密に不変であり、(2)表形式の帰納的バイアスにより、表をよりよく理解することができます。 当社の評価では、TableFormerがSQA、WTQ、およびTabFactテーブル推論データセットのすべての設定で強力なベースラインを上回り、特に回答不変の行順序摂動(ベストベースラインより6%改善)に直面した場合、SQAで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成することが示されました。これは、TableFormerが影響を受けていない間に、以前のSOTAモデルのパフォーマンスが4%～ 6%低下するためです。', 'ru': 'Понимание таблиц является важным аспектом понимания естественного языка. Существующие модели для понимания таблиц требуют линеаризации структуры таблицы, где порядок строк или столбцов кодируется как нежелательное смещение. Такие ложные смещения делают модель уязвимой к возмущениям порядка строк и столбцов. Кроме того, в ходе предыдущей работы не удалось тщательно смоделировать структуры таблиц или выравнивание табличного текста, что препятствует пониманию табличного текста. В этой работе мы предлагаем надежную и структурно осведомленную архитектуру кодирования табличного текста TableFormer, где табличные структурные смещения полностью интегрированы через изучаемые смещения внимания. TableFormer (1) строго инвариантен порядкам строк и столбцов, и (2) может лучше понимать таблицы благодаря своим табличным индуктивным смещениям. Наши оценки показали, что TableFormer превосходит сильные базовые линии во всех настройках на наборах данных для рассуждений таблиц SQA, WTQ и TabFact и достигает самой современной производительности на SQA, особенно при столкновении с возмущениями порядка строк и столбцов с инвариантами ответа (6% улучшение по сравнению с лучшим базовым уровнем), потому что производительность предыдущих моделей SOTA падает на 4% - 6% при столкновении с такими возмущениями, в то время как TableFormer не подвергается воздействию.', 'zh': '解表者,自然语言解之要也。 今模形须结构之线性化,其行或列次第编码为不须之差。 虚差易动行和列。 又前事未对表构表本对齐式穷建模,以阻表理解能力。 于此之中,建一健壮而结构之表文本编码架构TableFormer,其表格偏差,一以可学之意力偏合。 TableFormer (1) 对行序严不定,且 (2) 以其表格归差,可以善解表。 臣等评估,TableFormer在SQA,WTQ与TabFact表推理数集所有置中都优于强基线,而于SQA上得最先进之性,特于对案不变之行和列次第扰动时(比最佳基线增6%),以前SOTA模形于此扰动之性降4%-6%,而TableFormer不染也。', 'hi': 'तालिकाओं को समझना प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ का एक महत्वपूर्ण पहलू है। तालिका समझने के लिए मौजूदा मॉडल को तालिका संरचना के रैखिककरण की आवश्यकता होती है, जहां पंक्ति या स्तंभ क्रम को एक अवांछित पूर्वाग्रह के रूप में एन्कोड किया जाता है। इस तरह के नकली पूर्वाग्रह मॉडल को पंक्ति और स्तंभ क्रम की गड़बड़ी के लिए कमजोर बनाते हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, पूर्व कार्य ने तालिका संरचनाओं या तालिका-पाठ संरेखणों को पूरी तरह से मॉडलिंग नहीं किया है, जो तालिका-पाठ समझने की क्षमता में बाधा डालते हैं। इस काम में, हम एक मजबूत और संरचनात्मक रूप से जागरूक टेबल-टेक्स्ट एन्कोडिंग आर्किटेक्चर TableFormer का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जहां सारणीबद्ध संरचनात्मक पूर्वाग्रहों को सीखने योग्य ध्यान पूर्वाग्रहों के माध्यम से पूरी तरह से शामिल किया जाता है। TableFormer (1) पंक्ति और स्तंभ आदेशों के लिए सख्ती से अपरिवर्तनीय है, और, (2) अपने सारणीबद्ध आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रहों के कारण तालिकाओं को बेहतर ढंग से समझ सकता है। हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चला है कि TableFormer SQA, WTQ और TabFact तालिका तर्क डेटासेट पर सभी सेटिंग्स में मजबूत बेसलाइन को बेहतर बनाता है, और SQA पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, खासकर जब उत्तर-अपरिवर्तनीय पंक्ति और कॉलम ऑर्डर गड़बड़ी (सर्वश्रेष्ठ बेसलाइन पर 6% सुधार) का सामना करना पड़ता है, क्योंकि पिछले SOTA मॉडल का प्रदर्शन 4% - 6% तक गिर जाता है जब इस तरह की परेशानियों का सामना करना पड़ता है जबकि TableFormer प्रभावित नहीं होता है।', 'ga': 'Is gné thábhachtach de thuiscint teanga nádúrtha é táblaí a thuiscint. Teastaíonn líneáil struchtúr an tábla ó shamhlacha atá ann cheana chun tábla a thuiscint, áit a bhfuil ord rónna nó colúin ionchódaithe mar laofacht nach dteastaíonn. Fágann laofachtaí spíonacha den sórt sin an tsamhail i mbaol suaiteadh ord sraitheanna agus colúin. Ina theannta sin, níor mhúnlaigh réamhobair na struchtúir tábla nó na hailínithe téacs tábla go críochnúil, rud a chuir bac ar chumas tuisceana ar théacs tábla. Sa obair seo, molaimid ailtireacht ionchódaithe tábla-téacs atá láidir agus feasach ó thaobh struchtúir de, ina n-ionchorpraítear laofachtaí struchtúracha táblaí go hiomlán trí laofachtaí airde infhoghlama. Tá TableFormer (1) fíor-athraitheach ar orduithe as a chéile agus colúin, agus, (2) d’fhéadfadh sé táblaí a thuiscint níos fearr mar gheall ar a laofacht tháblach ionduchtach. Thaispeáin ár meastóireachtaí go sáraíonn TableFormer bunlínte láidre i ngach socrú ar thacair sonraí réasúnaíochta táblaí SQA, WTQ agus TabFact, agus go mbaineann sé an fheidhmíocht is nua-aimseartha amach ar SQA, go háirithe nuair atáthar ag tabhairt aghaidh ar shuaiteadh ord athróg freagartha agus ord colúin (feabhsú 6% ar an bhunlíne is fearr), toisc go dtagann laghdú 4% - 6% ar fheidhmíocht samhlacha SOTA roimhe seo nuair a bhíonn suaitheadh den sórt sin i ndán dóibh cé nach bhfuil aon tionchar ar TableFormer.', 'ka': 'მაგილის გაგრძნობა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ადექტურია თავისუფლიოს გაგრძნობა. მხოლოდ ცხრილის სტრუქტურაციის მიმდინარე მოდელები უნდა წერტილი სტრუქტურაციას, სადაც წერტილი ან სტრუქტურაციის წერტილი კოდირებულია როგორც არ ასეთი ძალიან ძალიან წარმოდგენები მოდელის წარმოდგენელება და სვეტის წარმოდგენება. დამატებით, წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო არ მოდულია ცხრილის სტრუქტურები ან ცხრილის ტექსტის სტრუქტურები, რომლებიც შეუძლებელია ც ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მუშაობელი და სტრუქტურურად ცნობიერებულია ტექსტის კოდექტიკური აქტიქტიკური ტაბლიFormer, სადაც სტრუქტურული სტრუქტური სამუშაოებები სრულად ტაბლიFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better because of its tabular inductive biases. ჩვენი განსაზღვრებები გაჩვენეთ, რომ TableFormer უფრო ძალიან ბაზი ხაზები SQA, WTQ და TabFact ცხრილის განსაზღვრების მონაცემების განსაზღვრების შესაძლებლობაში გავაკეთება, და განსაზღვრებით, როცა განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებული ხაზები და სვეტის განსაზღვრებულებ იმიტომ, რომ წინა SOTA მოდელების გამოსახულება 4% - 6%, როდესაც ასეთი პერტუბურაციების გამოსახულება, მაგრამ TableFormer არ აღმოჩნდება.', 'hu': 'A táblázatok megértése fontos szempont a természetes nyelv megértésének. A meglévő táblázatmegértési modellek megkövetelik a táblázatstruktúra linearizálását, ahol a sor- vagy oszlopsorrend nem kívánt elfogultságként van kódolva. Az ilyen hamis előítéletek sebezhetővé teszik a modellt a sor- és oszloprendszeri zavarokra. Továbbá a korábbi munkák nem modellezték alaposan a táblázatstruktúrákat vagy a táblázat-szöveg igazításokat, ami akadályozta a táblázat-szöveg értését. Ebben a munkában egy robusztus és strukturálisan tudatos táblázat-szöveg kódolási architektúrát javasolunk TableFormer, ahol a táblázatos strukturális elfogultságok teljes mértékben beépülnek a tanulható figyelemfelkeltések révén. TableFormer (1) szigorúan invariáns a sor- és oszlopsorrendben, és, (2) jobban megérti a táblázatokat a táblázatos induktív előírásai miatt. Értékeléseink azt mutatták, hogy a TableFormer az SQA, WTQ és TabFact táblázatérvelési adatkészletek minden beállításában meghaladja az erős alapvető értékeket, és a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el SQA-n, különösen akkor, ha válasz-invariáns sor- és oszloprendezési zavarokkal szembesül (6%-os javulás a legjobb alapvető értékhez képest), mivel a korábbi SOTA modellek teljesítménye 4%-kal csökken, ha ilyen zavarokkal szembesülnek, miközben a TableFormer nem érinti.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση των πινάκων είναι μια σημαντική πτυχή της κατανόησης της φυσικής γλώσσας. Τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα για την κατανόηση του πίνακα απαιτούν γραμμοποίηση της δομής του πίνακα, όπου η σειρά γραμμών ή στηλών κωδικοποιείται ως ανεπιθύμητη προκατάληψη. Τέτοιες ψεύτικες προκαταλήψεις καθιστούν το μοντέλο ευάλωτο σε διαταραχές της σειράς γραμμών και στηλών. Επιπλέον, προηγούμενες εργασίες δεν έχουν διαμορφώσει λεπτομερώς τις δομές πίνακα ή τις ευθυγραμμίσεις πίνακα-κειμένου, εμποδίζοντας την ικανότητα κατανόησης πίνακα-κειμένου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια ισχυρή και δομικά συνειδητή αρχιτεκτονική κωδικοποίησης πίνακα-κειμένου όπου οι πίνακες δομικές προκαταλήψεις ενσωματώνονται πλήρως μέσω μαθησιακών προκαταλήψεων προσοχής. Ο TableFormer είναι (1) αυστηρά αμετάβλητος στις διαταγές γραμμών και στηλών, και, (2) θα μπορούσε να κατανοήσει καλύτερα τους πίνακες λόγω των πινάκων επαγωγικών προκατάληψης του. Οι αξιολογήσεις μας έδειξαν ότι το TableFormer ξεπερνά τις ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης σε όλες τις ρυθμίσεις σε σύνολα δεδομένων συλλογισμού πινάκων SQA, WTQ και TabFact και επιτυγχάνει τις τελευταίες επιδόσεις σε SQA, ειδικά όταν αντιμετωπίζει διαταραχές της σειράς γραμμών και στηλών (6% βελτίωση έναντι της καλύτερης γραμμής βάσης), επειδή η απόδοση των προηγούμενων μοντέλων SOTA μειώνεται κατά 4,6% όταν αντιμετωπίζει τέτοιες διαταραχές ενώ το TableFormer δεν επηρεάζεται.', 'it': "Comprendere le tabelle è un aspetto importante della comprensione del linguaggio naturale. I modelli esistenti per la comprensione della tabella richiedono la linearizzazione della struttura della tabella, dove l'ordine di riga o colonna è codificato come un bias indesiderato. Tali pregiudizi falsi rendono il modello vulnerabile alle perturbazioni dell'ordine delle righe e delle colonne. Inoltre, il lavoro precedente non ha modellato accuratamente le strutture della tabella o gli allineamenti tabella-testo, ostacolando la capacità di comprensione tabella-testo. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un'architettura di codifica tabella-testo robusta e strutturalmente consapevole TableFormer, in cui i bias strutturali tabulari sono incorporati completamente attraverso bias di attenzione imparabili. TableFormer è (1) strettamente invariante agli ordini delle righe e delle colonne, e, (2) potrebbe comprendere meglio le tabelle a causa dei suoi bias induttivi tabulari. Le nostre valutazioni hanno dimostrato che TableFormer supera le solide linee di base in tutte le impostazioni sui set di dati di ragionamento delle tabelle SQA, WTQ e TabFact e raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia su SQA, specialmente quando si affrontano perturbazioni invarianti di riga e colonna (miglioramento del 6% rispetto alla migliore linea di base), perché le prestazioni dei modelli SOTA precedenti scendono del 4% - 6% quando affrontano tali perturbazioni mentre TableFormer non è influenzato.", 'lt': "lentelės yra svarbus natūralaus kalbos supratimo aspektas. Esami lentelės supratimo modeliai reikalauja lentelės struktūros linijinio nustatymo, kai eilutės ar stulpelio eilutės yra koduojamos kaip nepageidaujamas nukrypimas. Tokie neigiami nukreipimai daro model į pažeidžiamą eilės ir stulpelių tvarkos perturbacijoms. Be to, ankstesniame darbe nebuvo nuodugniai modeliuojamos lentelės struktūros arba lentelės ir teksto suderinimai, trukdantys lentelės ir teksto supratimo gebėjimui. Šiame darbe siūlome tvirtą ir struktūriškai suprantamą stalo tekstą, koduojantį architektūros lentelę Former, kur lentelės struktūriniai iškraipymai visiškai įtraukiami pasimokomų dėmesio iškraipymų būdu. TableFormer yra (1) griežtai neatitinka eilučių ir stulpelių eilučių ir (2) galėtų geriau suprasti lenteles dėl lentelės indukcinių nuokrypių. Mūsų vertinimai parodė, kad TableFormer visais SQA, WTQ ir TabFact lentelių pagrindimo duomenų rinkiniais rezultatai yra didesni už tvirtus bazinius rodiklius ir pasiekti pažangiausius SQA rezultatus, ypač kai susiduriama su atsakymų neatitinkančiomis eilutės ir stulpelių eilutės perturbacijomis (6 % pagerėjimas, palyginti su geriausia bazine verte),  because previous SOTA models' performance drops by 4% - 6% when facing such perturbations while TableFormer is not affected.", 'kk': 'Кестелерді түсіну - табиғи тілді түсіну маңызды аспекті. Кесте түсіндіру үшін бар үлгілер кесте құрылымының сызықты түсіндіру керек, жерде жол не бағандар реті қаламаған тәртіпсіздік ретінде кодтауы керек. Бұл кездейтін өзгерістер үлгісін жол және бағандар ретінде өзгертуге болады. Кесте мәтіннің түсініктерін өзгерту үшін алдыңғы жұмыс кесте құрылғыларын не кесте мәтіннің түсініктерін өзгертпейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз кесте- мәтін кодтамасының архитектурасын құпты және структуралық түсіндіру кестесін таңдаймыз. Former, қайда кесте құрылғыларының тәртіпсіздіктері білім беретін қа КестеFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better because of its tabular inductive biases. Біздің оқиғаларымыз таблицаFormer SQA, WTQ және TabFact кестесінің оқиғаларының барлық баптауларында күшті негізгі сызықтарды өзгертеді, және SQA дегенде әртіпсіздік жағдайының күйін жеткізеді, осымен қатар, жауап және бағандар ретінде жауап берілген со Өйткені алдыңғы SOTA үлгілерінің әрекеттері 4% - 6% деген кезде, TableFormer бақыламаған кезде, бұл белсенділіктерге қарсы болып тұрғанда, өйткені.', 'ms': 'Memahami jadual adalah aspek penting pemahaman bahasa alam. Existing models for table understanding require linearization of the table structure, where row or column order is encoded as an unwanted bias.  Kebiasian yang menggerunkan ini membuat model rentan terhadap gangguan urutan baris dan lajur. Lagipun, kerja sebelumnya tidak telah mengubah struktur jadual atau penyesuaian teks jadual secara teliti, menghalangi kemampuan pemahaman teks jadual. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan teks-jadual pengekodan arkitektur TableFormer yang kuat dan sedar secara struktur, di mana biases struktur tabular disertai sepenuhnya melalui biases perhatian yang boleh dipelajari. Table Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahawa TableFormer melampaui garis dasar yang kuat dalam semua tetapan pada set data penyebab jadual SQA, WTQ dan TabFact, dan mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art pada SQA, terutama apabila menghadapi perturbasi baris-invarian dan urutan lajur (peningkatan 6% atas garis dasar terbaik), - kerana prestasi model SOTA terdahulu menurun 4% - 6% bila menghadapi gangguan semasa TableFormer tidak terkesan.', 'mk': 'Разбирањето на таблиците е важен аспект на природното разбирање на јазикот. Постојаните модели за разбирање на табелата бараат линијализација на структурата на табелата, каде редот на редовите или колоните е кодиран како нежелен предрасуд. Таквите нервозни предрасуди го прават моделот ранлив на поред на редови и колони. Покрај тоа, претходната работа не ги моделираше структурите на масата или израмнувањата на текстот на масата, што ја попречува способноста за разбирање на текстот на масата. Во оваа работа, предложуваме robust и структурно свесен табелен текст кодирање на архитектурата TableFormer, каде табуларните структурни предрасуди се вклучени целосно преку научни предрасуди на вниманието. TableFormer е (1) стриктно инваријантен на редови и колони наредби, и, (2) може да ги разбере таблите подобро поради нејзините таблички индуктивни предрасуди. Нашите проценки покажаа дека TableFormer ги надминува силните основни линии во сите поставувања на SQA, WTQ и TabFact табелата расправни податоци, и постигнува најдобри резултати на SQA, особено кога се соочува со инваријантни партии на редови и колони (подобрување од 6 отсто во однос на најдобрата основна линија), Бидејќи претходните модели на СОТА се намалуваат за 4-6 отсто кога се соочуваат со вакви пертурбирања, додека TableFormer не е влијана.', 'ml': 'ബോധ്യപ്പെടുന്ന മേശകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ ഗുരുതരമാണ്. ടേബിളിന്റെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിനുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ടേബിളിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ ലൈനിയറഷന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്,  ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കക്ഷികള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡലിനെ ക്ഷീണിതമാക്കുന്നു വരിയും നിര കേന്ദ്രത്തിന്റെ കല്\u200d കൂടാതെ, മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി ടേബിളിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളോ ടേബിള്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതോ മാതൃകയായി മാറ്റ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു റോബോസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് കൃത്യമായി മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന ടേബിള്\u200d എക്സിക്കറ്റ് എക്സിക്കറ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റേഷന TableFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases.  ഞങ്ങളുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് SQA, WTQ, TabFact ടേബിളിലെ എല്ലാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളിലും ശക്തിയുള്ള ബേസ്ലൈനുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, SQA-ലെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സാധ്യതയി കാരണം മുമ്പുള്ള SOTA മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d 4% - 6% താഴേക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ടേബിള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രയോജനപ്പെടാത്ത സമയത്ത് ഇത്', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tat-tabelli huwa aspett importanti tal-fehim naturali tal-lingwa. Il-mudelli eżistenti għall-fehim tat-tabella jeħtieġu linearizzazzjoni tal-istruttura tat-tabella, fejn l-ordni tar-ringiela jew tal-kolonna hija kkodifikata bħala preġudizzju mhux mixtieq. Dawn il-preġudizzji spurjużi jagħmlu l-mudell vulnerabbli għal perturbazzjonijiet fl-ordni tar-ringieli u tal-kolonni. Additionally, prior work has not thoroughly modeled the table structures or table-text alignments, hindering the table-text understanding ability.  F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu test ta’ tabella b’saħħtu u strutturalment konxju li jikkodifika l-arkitettura Table Former, fejn il-preġudizzji strutturali tabulari huma inkorporati kompletament permezz ta’ preġudizzji ta’ attenzjoni li wieħed jista’ jitgħallem. TableFormer hija (1) strettament invarjanti għall-ordnijiet tar-ringiela u tal-kolonna, u, (2) tista’ tifhem aħjar it-tabelli minħabba l-preġudizzji induttivi tabulari tagħha. L-evalwazzjonijiet tagħna wrew li TableFormer taqbeż il-linji bażi b’saħħithom fl-istabbilimenti kollha dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ raġunament ta’ tabella SQA, WTQ u TabFact, u tikseb prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fuq SQA, speċjalment meta tiffaċċja perturbazzjonijiet fl-ordni tar-ringiela u tal-kolonna invarjanti (titjib ta’ 6% fuq l-aħjar linja bażi), - minħabba li l- prestazzjoni tal- mudelli ta ’ SOTA preċedenti tonqos b’ 4% - 6% meta tiffaċċja tali perturbazzjonijiet filwaqt li TableFormer ma tkunx affettwata.', 'mn': 'Хүснэгтийг ойлгох нь байгалийн хэл ойлголтын чухал асуудал юм. Хүснэгтийн ойлголтын Existing загварууд хүснэгтийн бүтцийг шулуун шулуун загвар хэрэгтэй. Харин мөр эсвэл баганын дарааллыг хүсэхгүй байдлаар кодлогддог. Ийм гайхалтай нөлөө загварыг мөр, баганы дарааллаас хамаарч болгодог. Мөн өмнөх ажил хүснэгт бүтээгдэхүүн эсвэл хүснэгт-текст тэгшитгэлийг бүрэн загварчлахгүй, хүснэгт-текст ойлгох чадварыг зогсоож байна. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид хүснэгт-текст кодлох архитектур TableFormer-г хүчтэй болон бүтээмжтэй ойлголттой санал дэвшүүлнэ. Харин хүснэгт бүтээмжтэй байдал нь суралцдаг анхаарал хандлагатай байдалд бүрэн нийлүүлсэн ХүснэгтFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better because of its tabular inductive biases. Бидний дүгнэлт нь TableFormer нь SQA, WTQ болон TabFact хүснэгт өгөгдлийн санааны бүх хэмжээнд хүчтэй суурь шулуунуудыг илтгэдэг ба SQA дээр урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, ялангуяа хариулт-агуулагч мөр болон баганы дарааллаас хамгийн сайн суурь шулуунууд дээр 6% сайн сайжруул Яагаад гэвэл өмнөх SOTA загварын үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагаа 4%-6% багасгаж байгаа юм.', 'no': 'Forståking av tabeller er ein viktig aspekt for naturspråk forståking. Det eksisterande modeller for tabellforståelse krev linearisering av tabellstrukturen, der radrekkjefølgja eller kolonnerekkjefølgja er koda som ikkje ønskte forståking. Desse spurre forsvinningane gjer modellen sårbar til radrekkefølgje og kolonnerekkefølgje. I tillegg har førre arbeid ikkje fullstendig modellert tabellstrukturene eller tabelletekstjusteringa, som hindrar å forstå tabelleteksten. I denne arbeida foreslår vi ein robust og strukturelt kjent tabell- kodingsarkitekturkitektur Former, der tabulære strukturelle forvirkningar er inkludert fullstendig gjennom lærbar oppmerksområde. TabellFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column order, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases. Våre evalueringar viste at tabellFormer utfører sterke baselinjer i alle innstillingane på SQA, WTQ og TabFact-tabelle-datasett, og oppnår kunsthandlinga på SQA, særleg når du står med oppgåver av svarinvariant rad og kolonnerekkefølgje (6% forbedring over den beste baselinja), Fordi utviklinga av førre SOTA- modeller nedtrekk med 4% - 6% når det står med slike turbasjonar mens TableFormer ikkje påvirkar.', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie tabel jest ważnym aspektem rozumienia języka naturalnego. Istniejące modele rozumienia tabeli wymagają linearyzacji struktury tabeli, w której kolejność wierszy lub kolumn jest zakodowana jako niechciana strona. Takie fałszywe uprzedzenia sprawiają, że model jest podatny na zaburzenia kolejności wierszy i kolumn. Dodatkowo wcześniejsze prace nie przeprowadziły dokładnego modelowania struktur tabeli lub wyrównania tabeli-tekstu, utrudniając zrozumienie tabeli-tekst. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy solidną i strukturalnie świadomą architekturę kodowania tabeli-tekstu TableFormer, w której tabelaryczne uprzedzenia strukturalne są całkowicie włączane poprzez nauczalne uprzedzenia uwagi. TableFormer jest (1) ściśle niezmienny w stosunku do kolejności wierszy i kolumn i, (2) mógłby lepiej zrozumieć tabele ze względu na tabelarne uprzedzenia indukcyjne. Nasze oceny wykazały, że TableFormer przewyższa silne linie bazowe we wszystkich ustawieniach w zestawach danych rozumowania tabeli SQA, WTQ i TabFact oraz osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność SQA, zwłaszcza w przypadku zaburzeń kolejności wierszy i kolumn niezmiennych odpowiedzi (poprawa 6% nad najlepszą linią bazową), ponieważ wydajność poprzednich modeli SOTA spada o 4,6% w obliczu takich zakłóceń, podczas gdy TableFormer nie ma wpływu.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea tabelelor este un aspect important al înțelegerii limbajului natural. Modelele existente pentru înțelegerea tabelului necesită linearizarea structurii tabelului, în cazul în care ordinea rândurilor sau coloanelor este codificată ca o distorsiune nedorită. Astfel de prejudecăți false fac modelul vulnerabil la perturbațiile ordinii rândurilor și coloanelor. În plus, lucrările anterioare nu au modelat complet structurile tabelului sau alinierile tabel-text, împiedicând capacitatea de înțelegere tabel-text. În această lucrare, propunem o arhitectură robustă și conștientă din punct de vedere structural de codificare tabel-text TableFormer, în care prejudecățile structurale tabelare sunt încorporate complet prin prejudecăți de atenție care pot fi învățate. TableFormer este (1) strict invariant la ordinele de rânduri și coloane, și, (2) ar putea înțelege tabelele mai bine datorită prejudecăților inductive tabelare. Evaluările noastre au arătat că TableFormer depășește liniile de bază puternice în toate setările de date pentru raționamentul tabelului SQA, WTQ și TabFact și atinge performanțe de ultimă oră pe SQA, în special atunci când se confruntă cu perturbări invariante ale ordinii rândurilor și coloanelor (îmbunătățire cu 6% față de cea mai bună bază), deoarece performanța modelelor SOTA anterioare scade cu 4% - 6% atunci când se confruntă cu astfel de perturbări, în timp ce TableFormer nu este afectat.', 'sr': 'Razumevanje stolova je važan aspekt razumevanja prirodnog jezika. Postojeći modeli za razumijevanje stola zahtevaju linearizaciju strukture stola, gde se reda ili reda kolona kodira kao neoželjena predrasuda. Takve tvrdoglave predrasude čine model ranjivim prema redu i redu kolona. Osim toga, prethodni rad nije potpuno modelirao strukture stola ili poravnanje tablovog teksta, što sprječava sposobnost razumevanja tablovog teksta. U ovom poslu predlažemo snažnu i strukturno svjesnu arhitekturu kodiranja tablovog teksta TableFormer, gde su tabularne strukturne predrasude kompletno uključene kroz predrasude pažnje. TablicaFormer je (1) strogo invariant to row and column order, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases. Naša procjena pokazala je da TableFormer iznosi jake osnovne linije u svim postavkama o razmatranju podataka za SQA, WTQ i TabFact stolom i postiže izvršnost umjetnosti na SQA-u, posebno kada se suočavaju sa perturbacijama odgovornog invariantnog reda i kolona reda (poboljšanje od 6% nad najboljim osnovnim linijama), Zato što nastup prethodnih SOTA modela pada na 4% - 6% kada se suočava sa takvim perturbacijama dok TableFormer nije uticao.', 'so': 'Miiska garashada waa dhinac muhiim ah oo ku saabsan waxgarashada afka dabiicadda ah. Tusaalada ku jira waxgarashada miiska waxaa loo baahan yahay mid la kordhiyo dhismaha miiska, meesha lagu qorayo safka ama safka oo loo qorayo sida baas aan la filayn. Dhaqdhaqaaqa caynkaas ah ayaa samoolka ka dhiga mid aan caqli lahayn in safka iyo safka iskuulka lagu safeeyo. Sidoo kale shaqo horay uma sameyn dhismaha miiska ama isbedelka miiska, wuxuuna ka hor jeedinayaa awoodda garashada qoraalka ee miiska. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa khamiis iyo si rasmi ah u yaqaanno miis-text encoding dhismaha tababarka Former, meesha lagu soo qorayo tababar dhismaha dhaqaalaha ah oo lagu qorayo dhamaantood xagga hababka la baro. MiiskFormer is (1) strictly invaring to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better due to its tabar-based bias. Qiimeyntayadii waxay muuqatay in TableFormer wuxuu sameeyaa meelo xoog ah oo ku qoran dhammaan settings on SQA, WTQ iyo TabFact table reasoning, wuxuuna gaadhaa xaalad-state-of-art performance on SQA, khusuusan marka uu hor jeedo saf-invariant iyo safar column (6% improvement over the best baseline), Maxaa yeelay samooyinkii hore ee sameynta SOTA waxay ku dhici jireen 4% - 6% marka ay u jeedaan dhibaatooyinkaas oo kale iyadoo aan saameyn TableFormer.', 'sv': 'Att förstå tabeller är en viktig aspekt av förståelsen av naturligt språk. Befintliga modeller för tabellförståelse kräver linjärisering av tabellstrukturen, där rad- eller kolumnordning kodas som en oönskad bias. Sådana falska fördomar gör modellen sårbar för rad- och kolumnordning störningar. Dessutom har tidigare arbete inte noggrant modellerat tabellstrukturerna eller tabelltextjusteringarna, vilket hindrar förmågan att förstå tabell-text. I detta arbete föreslår vi en robust och strukturellt medveten tabell-text kodningsarkitektur TableFormer, där tabellstrukturella fördomar införlivas helt genom lärbara uppmärksamhetsdomar. TableFormer är (1) strikt invariant till rad- och kolumnordning, och, (2) kunde förstå tabeller bättre på grund av dess tabulära induktiva biaser. Våra utvärderingar visade att TableFormer presterar bättre än starka baslinjer i alla inställningar på SQA, WTQ och TabFact tabellresonemang datauppsättningar, och uppnår toppmoderna prestanda på SQA, särskilt vid svarsintervarianta rad- och kolumnordningsförändringar (6% förbättring jämfört med bästa baslinje). eftersom tidigare SOTA-modellers prestanda sjunker med 4% - 6% vid sådana störningar medan TableFormer inte påverkas.', 'si': 'මේස් තේරුම් ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව තේරුම් ගන්න. පැත්ත තේරුම්ගන්න විදියට තියෙන්න තියෙන මොඩේල් වලින් තේරුම්ගන්න පුළුවන් තේරුම්ගන්න, පැත්ත හා ස්තම්ප මෙච්චර ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් පැත්තක් සහ ස්තාම්පය ක්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් නි ඉතින්, මුලින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ ටේස්ක් සැකසුම් නැතුව නැතුව, ටේස්ක්-පාළුව තේරුම් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක මේ වැඩේ අපි ශක්තිමත් සහ සංවිධානයක් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ පැත්ත- පාළුවන් සංවිධානයක් පැත්තක් සංවිධානයක් තේබ ටැබ්ල් අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ටේබ්ල් වර්ගයෙන් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා SQA, WTQ සහ tab Factor ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා සැකසුම් සඳහා සැක මොකද කලින් SOTA මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරභාව 4% - 6% වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ ටේබ්ල් ෆෝර්මෙර් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරභාව', 'ta': 'புரிந்து கொள்ளும் அட்டவணைகள் இயற்கையான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ள முக்கியமான விளைவு. அட்டவணை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் தற்போதைய மாதிரிகளுக்கு அட்டவணை அமைப்பு வரிசைப்படுத்தல் தேவைப்படுகிறது, அங்கு வரிசையோ நெடுக இவ்வாறு பிரச்சனைகள் மாதிரி வரிசையில் மற்றும் நெடுவரிசையின் வரிசையில் பிரச்சனைகளை பாதிக்கும். அதற்கும் முன்னால் வேலை அட்டவணை அமைப்புகள் அல்லது அட்டவணை- உரை ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் முழுமையாக வடிவமைக்கப்படவில்லை, அட்டவணையின் ப இந்த வேலையில், நாம் அட்டவணை உரை குறியீட்டு அட்டவணை அட்டவணையின் அட்டவணையை முழுமையாக சேர் Former is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better due to its tabular inductive bias. எங்கள் மதிப்புகள் காண்பித்தது எஸ்கியா, WTQ மற்றும் TabFact அட்டவணை காரணங்களின் அனைத்து அமைப்புகளிலும் வலிமையான அடிப்படைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது மற்றும் SQA மீது செயல்படுத்தும் நிலையில் ச ஏனென்றால் முந்தைய SOTA மாதிரிகளின் செயல்பாடு 4% - 6% குறைகிறது அட்டவணை முன்பு பாதிக்கப்படவில்லையென்றால்.', 'ur': 'ٹیبلوں کا سمجھنا طبیعی زبان سمجھنے کے ایک اہم حصہ ہے۔ ٹیبل سمجھنے کے لئے موجود موڈل کے لئے ٹیبل ساختار کی linearization کی ضرورت ہے، جہاں صف یا ستون کے اوقات کو ناخواستہ بحث کے طور پر کوڈ کیا جاتا ہے. اس طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح اور ستونوں کے سطح کے مطابق مضبوط بناتے ہیں. اور اضافہ، پہلے کے کام ٹیبل ساختار یا ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل متصلات کو کامل نمودار نہیں کیا ہے، جو ٹیبل-ٹیکسٹ سمجھنے کی قابلیت سے روکتی ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک مضبوط اور ساختہ طور پر جاننے والے ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل-ٹیبل- TableFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better because of its tabular inductive biases. ہماری ارزیابی دکھائی تھی کہ ٹیبل Former SQA, WTQ اور TabFact ٹیبل ٹیبل منظور ڈاٹ سٹ میں قوی بنسٹ لینڈ کامل کرتا ہے، اور SQA پر استیٹ-آرت فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے، مخصوصا جب جواب-غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر کیونکہ پہلے SOTA موڈلوں کی فعالیت 4% - 6% کے ذریعہ ڈوب رہی ہے جبکہ TableFormer کے سامنے اس طرح کی مصیبت نہیں ہوتی۔', 'uz': "Jadvalni tasavvur qilish asl tilni tushunish muhim aspekti. Existing models for table understanding require linearization of the table structure, where row or column order is encoded as an unwanted bias.  Ushbu ko'pchilik qismlari modelni satr va ustun tartibi tartibi bilan qo'llaniladi. @ info: whatsthis Bu ishda, biz jadvali matn kodlash muammolari jadvalini tahrirlashni tahlil qilamiz. Former, bu yerda tabulyasi tuzilishi murakkabliklarni o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlari orqali butunlay qo'yiladi. Former is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better due to its tabular inductive bias. Bizning qiymatlarimizni ko'rsatadi, Jadvalning oldingi SQA, WTQ va TabFact jadvaldagi hamma moslamalarda katta asosiy asboblarni bajaradi va SQA haqiqiqiy satr va ustunlar tartibiqlarini bajaradi (eng yaxshi darajada yaxshi bajariladigan 6% bajariladi), @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Hiểu biết các bàn là một khía cạnh quan trọng của hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Người mẫu tồn tại cho việc hiểu biết bàn yêu cầu mã hóa cấu trúc bàn, nơi hàng hay trật tự cột được mã hóa như một thiên kiến không mong muốn. Những thói giả tạo này làm cho mô hình bị tổn thương bởi các khu vực và trật tự cột. Hơn nữa, các công việc trước chưa có thiết lập mô hình thiết lập thiết lập thiết lập cấu trúc bàn hay sắp xếp, cản trở khả năng hiểu chữ bàn. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một văn bản bàn quy mô cấu trúc trúc trúc vững chắc và có cấu trúc bảng trước đây, nơi các tật xấu cấu trúc được tổng hợp hoàn toàn nhờ khả năng tập trung. "Table Former" là (1) hoàn to àn không bao giờ sử dụng hàng loạt và mệnh lệnh cột, và (2) có thể hiểu rõ các bàn hơn nhờ vào sử dụng ngoại lệ nội bộ của nó. Những đánh giá của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng hầu hết hoàn thiện bản nền vững chắc trong tất cả các thiết lập về các nhà lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập lập trình SQA, WTQ và Tab, và đạt được trình độ cao nghệ thuật về SQA, đặc biệt khi đối diện với bất hợp lệ trả lời và trật tự cột (6) bởi vì trình độ trước của các mô hình SOTA giảm theo 4=-6=.=\'khi đối mặt với mối lo ngại đó trong khi Tablelex không bị ảnh hưởng.', 'nl': 'Het begrijpen van tabellen is een belangrijk aspect van het begrijpen van natuurlijke taal. Bestaande modellen voor tabelbegrip vereisen linearisatie van de tabelstructuur, waarbij rij- of kolomvolgorde wordt gecodeerd als een ongewenste bias. Dergelijke valse vooroordelen maken het model kwetsbaar voor verstoringen van rij- en kolomvolgorde. Bovendien hebben eerdere werkzaamheden de tabelstructuren of tabel-tekst uitlijningen niet grondig gemodelleerd, waardoor het begrip tabel-tekst wordt belemmerd. In dit werk stellen we een robuuste en structureel bewuste tabel-tekst coderingsarchitectuur voor TableFormer, waarbij tabulaire structurele biases volledig worden opgenomen door middel van leerbare aandachtsbeoorden. TableFormer is (1) strikt invariant ten opzichte van rij- en kolomvorden, en, (2) zou tabellen beter kunnen begrijpen vanwege zijn tabulaire inductieve biases. Uit onze evaluaties is gebleken dat TableFormer sterke baselines overtreft in alle instellingen op SQA-, WTQ- en TabFact-tabelredeneerdatasets, en state-of-the-art prestaties behaalt op SQA, vooral wanneer het wordt geconfronteerd met antwoorden-invariante rij- en kolomvolgorde verstoringen (6% verbetering ten opzichte van de beste baseline), omdat de prestaties van eerdere SOTA-modellen met 4,6% dalen wanneer dergelijke verstoringen worden geconfronteerd terwijl TableFormer niet wordt beïnvloed.', 'da': 'Forståelse af tabeller er et vigtigt aspekt af naturlig sprogforståelse. Eksisterende modeller til tabelforståelse kræver linearisering af tabelstrukturen, hvor rækkefølge eller kolonne kodes som en uønsket bias. Sådanne falske fordomme gør modellen sårbar over for række- og kolonneordenen forstyrrelser. Derudover har tidligere arbejde ikke grundigt modelleret tabel strukturer eller tabel-tekst justeringer, hvilket hindrer tabel-tekst forståelse evne. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en robust og strukturelt bevidst tabel-tekst kodningsarkitektur TableFormer, hvor tabel strukturelle fordele indarbejdes fuldstændigt gennem lærbare opmærksomhed fordele. TableFormer er (1) strengt invariant for række- og kolonneordener, og, (2) kunne forstå tabeller bedre på grund af dens tabel induktive skævheder. Vores evalueringer viste, at TableFormer overgår stærke baselines i alle indstillinger på SQA, WTQ og TabFact tabelræsonnement datasæt, og opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne på SQA, især når der står over for svarinvariant række- og kolonneorden forstyrrelser (6% forbedring i forhold til den bedste baseline), fordi tidligere SOTA-modellers ydeevne falder med 4% - 6%, når de står over for sådanne forstyrrelser, mens TableFormer ikke påvirkes.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje stolova je važan aspekt razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. Postojeći modeli za razumijevanje stola zahtijevaju linearizaciju strukture stola, gdje se reda ili reda kolona kodira kao neočekivana pristrasnost. Takve tvrdoglave predrasude čine model ranjivim prema redu i redu kolona. Osim toga, prethodni rad nije potpuno modelirao strukture stolice ili poravnanje tablovog teksta, što sprječava sposobnost razumijevanja tablovog teksta. U ovom poslu predlažemo snažnu i strukturno svjesnu arhitekturu kodiranja tablica teksta TableFormer, gdje su tabularne strukturne predrasude uključene potpuno kroz predrasude učenja pažnje. TablicaFormer je (1) strogo invariant to row and column order, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases. Naše procjene pokazale su da TableFormer iznosi jake osnovne linije u svim postavkama o razmatranju podataka SQA, WTQ i TabFact tablice i postiže postignuće postupak umjetnosti na SQA-u, posebno kada se suočavaju s perturbacijama odgovornog invariantnog reda i kolona reda (poboljšanje od 6% nad najboljim početnim linijama), Budući da su učinkoviti prethodnih SOTA modela pala za 4% - 6% kada se suočavaju s takvim perturbacijama dok TableFormer nije utjecao na to.', 'bg': 'Разбирането на таблиците е важен аспект на разбирането на естествения език. Съществуващите модели за разбиране на таблицата изискват линейнизация на структурата на таблицата, където реда на редовете или колоните е кодиран като нежелано отклонение. Такива фалшиви пристрастия правят модела уязвим към смущения в реда на редовете и колоните. Освен това предишната работа не е моделирала подробно структурите на таблиците или подравняванията на таблицата-текст, което затруднява способността за разбиране на таблицата-текст. В тази работа предлагаме стабилна и структурно осъзната архитектура таблицо-текст кодираща архитектура Таблични структурни отклонения са интегрирани изцяло чрез усвояеми отклонения на вниманието. TableFormer е (1) строго инвариращ към реда и колоните, и, (2) може да разбере таблиците по-добре поради своите индуктивни наклонения в таблиците. Нашите оценки показаха, че е по-добре от силните базови линии във всички настройки на масивите от данни за разсъждения на таблиците и постига най-съвременно представяне на СQA, особено когато се сблъскват с нарушения в реда на редовете и колоните с неизменни отговори (6% подобрение спрямо най-добрата базова линия), защото производителността на предишните модели спада с 4% - 6%, когато са изправени пред такива смущения, докато не е засегната.', 'de': 'Tabellen zu verstehen ist ein wichtiger Aspekt des Verständnisses natürlicher Sprache. Bestehende Modelle zum Tabellenverstehen erfordern eine Linearisierung der Tabellenstruktur, wobei Zeilen- oder Spaltenfolge als unerwünschter Bias kodiert wird. Solche falschen Verzerrungen machen das Modell anfällig für Störungen der Zeilen- und Spaltenordnung. Darüber hinaus wurden in früheren Arbeiten die Tabellenstrukturen oder Tabellen-Text-Ausrichtungen nicht gründlich modelliert, was das Verständnis von Tabellen-Text behindert. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine robuste und strukturell bewusste TableFormer-Kodierungsarchitektur vor, in der tabellarische strukturelle Verzerrungen vollständig durch erlernbare Aufmerksamkeitsverzerrungen integriert werden. TableFormer ist (1) streng invariant gegenüber Zeilen- und Spaltenordnungen und, (2) könnte Tabellen aufgrund seiner tabellarischen induktiven Verzerrungen besser verstehen. Unsere Auswertungen zeigten, dass TableFormer starke Baselines in allen Einstellungen für SQA-, WTQ- und TabFact-Tabellenargumentationsdatensätze übertrifft und State-of-the-Art-Performance bei SQA erzielt, insbesondere bei Antworten-invarianten Zeilen- und Spaltenreihenfolgestörungen (6% Verbesserung gegenüber der besten Baseline), weil die Leistung früherer SOTA-Modelle bei solchen Störungen um 4,6% abnimmt, während TableFormer nicht beeinträchtigt wird.', 'id': 'Memahami tabel adalah aspek penting dari pemahaman bahasa alam. Model yang ada untuk pemahaman tabel membutuhkan linearisasi struktur tabel, di mana baris atau kolom tertib dikodeksi sebagai bias yang tidak diinginkan. Hal-hal yang mengganggu membuat model rentan terhadap perturbasi baris dan kolom. Selain itu, pekerjaan sebelumnya tidak telah mengubah secara teliti struktur tabel atau penyesuaian tabel-teks, menghalangi kemampuan pemahaman tabel-teks. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah tabel-teks pengekodan arkitektur TableFormer yang kuat dan secara struktural sadar, di mana biases struktural tabular disertai sepenuhnya melalui biases perhatian yang dapat dipelajari. TableFormer adalah (1) benar-benar invarian ke perintah baris dan kolom, dan, (2) dapat memahami tabel lebih baik karena biases induktif tabularnya. Evaluasi kami menunjukkan bahwa TableFormer melampaui garis dasar yang kuat dalam semua pengaturan pada sett data meranungkan tabel SQA, WTQ dan TabFact, dan mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art pada SQA, terutama ketika menghadapi baris-invarian jawaban dan urutan kolom perturbasi (peningkatan 6% atas garis dasar terbaik), Karena prestasi model SOTA sebelumnya menurun 4% - 6% ketika menghadapi gangguan seperti itu sementara TableFormer tidak terkena kesan.', 'sw': 'Kuelewa meza ni sehemu muhimu ya kuelewa lugha ya asili. Mfano wa kuwepo kwa kuelewa mezani unahitaji kuboresha muundo wa meza, ambapo amri ya safu au safu inawekwa kama upendeleo usiotarajiwa. Such spurious biases make the model vulnerable to row and column order perturbations.  Kwa nyongeza, kazi ya kabla haijaweka miundombinu ya meza au viungo vya maandishi ya meza, kuzuia uwezo wa kuelewa maandishi ya meza. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza ujumbe wa kugomea na kwa uhakika unaoelewa kwa ujumla wa ujumbe wa ujumbe wa ujumbe wa ujumbe unaoandika Mifumo ya Mazingira, ambapo upendeleo wa miundombinu umejumuishwa kabisa kwa njia ya upendeleo wa kujifunza. Mfuko wa zamani ni (1) haijapata vizuri kwa safu na amri za simu, na, (2) inaweza kuelewa meza bora kwa sababu ya upendeleo wake wa tabia. Tafiti zetu zilionyesha kuwa Table Former inafanya misingi yenye nguvu katika maeneo yote yanayohusiana na SQA, WTQ na TabFact, na kupata hali ya utendaji wa sanaa kwenye SQA, hasa pale wanapokutana na mstari wa intaneti na amri ya simu (asilimia 6% kuboreshwa zaidi kwenye msingi bora), Kwa sababu maonesho ya mifano ya zamani ya SOTA yanapungua kwa asilimia 4 - 6% wakati wanakabiliwa na matatizo haya wakati Table ya zamani haiathiriki.', 'ko': '표를 이해하는 것은 자연 언어 이해의 중요한 부분이다.기존의 표 이해 모델은 표 구조를 선형화해야 하는데 그 중에서 줄이나 열의 순서는 필요 없는 편차로 인코딩된다.이런 거짓된 편차는 모델로 하여금 줄과 열의 순서가 교란하는 영향을 받기 쉽다.그 밖에 이전의 작업은 표 구조나 표 텍스트의 정렬을 완전히 모의하지 않았기 때문에 표 텍스트의 이해 능력을 방해했다.이 작업에서 우리는 건장하고 구조적 감지를 가진 표 텍스트 인코딩 구조인 TableFormer를 제기했는데 그 중에서 표 구조의 편차는 완전히 학습 가능한 주의 편차를 통해 통합되었다.TableFormer(1)는 줄과 열의 순서가 엄격하고 변하지 않으며, (2) 표의 귀납적 편차로 인해 표를 더욱 잘 이해할 수 있다.우리의 평가에 의하면 TableFormer는 SQA, WTQ와 TabFact표 추리 데이터 집합의 모든 설정에서 강한 기선보다 우수하고 SQA에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했다. 특히 답안이 변하지 않는 줄과 열 순서의 교란에 직면했을 때(최적 기선보다 6% 향상)이전의 SOTA 모델은 이런 방해를 받았을 때 성능이 4%-6% 떨어졌고 TableFormer는 영향을 받지 않았기 때문이다.', 'fa': 'متوجه میز ها یک منطقه مهم درک زبان طبیعی است. مدل\u200cهای موجود برای درک کردن میز نیاز دارند که خط\u200cبندی از ساختار میز باشد، جایی که خط\u200cبندی یا ستون\u200cبندی به عنوان تغییر خواسته\u200cای کودد می\u200cشود. چنین تغییرات وحشتناک این مدل را به صف و سفارش ستون آسیب می\u200cدهد. اضافه\u200cای از این، کار پیشینیان ساختار میز یا تنظیم متن میز را به طور کامل نموده نمی\u200cشود، که باعث می\u200cشود توانایی درک متن میز را متوقف کند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک معماری قابل و ساختاری که از طریق حفاظت توجه یادآوری می\u200cشود از طریق ساختاری که از طریق حفاظت توجه یادآوری کاملاً جمع می\u200cشوند. TableFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better due to tabular inductive biases. ارزیابی\u200cهای ما نشان داده است که TableFormer در تمام تنظیمات\u200cهای SQA, WTQ و TabFact داده\u200cهای منطقی کردن میز استفاده می\u200cکند، و به اجرای موقعیت هنری روی SQA، مخصوصا در حالی که با پاسخ\u200cگیری\u200cهای پاسخ\u200cگیری\u200cکننده و سفارش ستون\u200cها (6% بهتر از بهترین خط\u200cهای بنیادی) پیش می\u200cبرد چون عملکرد مدل SOTA قبلی 4% - 6% در حالی که با این تغییرات روبرو می\u200cشوند در حالی که TableFormer تاثیر نمی\u200cیابد.', 'tr': 'Täzelikleri düşünmek tebigy dil düşünmesiniň wajyp aspektidir. Sahypa düşürmek üçin bar nusgalar täblisaň strukturynyň çyzgylygyny talep edýär. Bu ýerde setir ýa sütün sırasy islemeýän bir sowgat hökmünde kodlanýar. Böyle garip noktalar hatlar ve sütun sırasına hassalar. Hemmäpli, öňki işiň täblisaň strukturasy ýa täblisaň-metin çyzygyny düz modellendirmedi. Bu işde biz güýçli we strukturly tanyş bir täblisaň-metin kodleme arhitekturlygyny teklip edip görkeýäris TäblerFormer is (1) strict invalidir to row and column orders, and, (2) could understand tables better because of his tabular inductive biases. Bizim değerlendirmelerimiz TableFormer, SQA, WTQ ve TabFact täblisinin razılaşması veri setlerinde güçlü baselinin üstüne getirdiğini ve SQA üzerinde sungat eserini başardığını gösterdi, özellikle de cevap-boşaltıcı setir ve sütun sırası çarpıldığında (6% en iyi baselinin üstünde gelişmesi), Çünki öňki SOTA nusgalary 4%-6% tarapyndan çykyp gitdi we TableFormer täsirlenmedi.', 'af': "Verstaan tabelle is 'n belangrike aspekt van natuurlike taal verstanding. Bestaande modele vir tabel verstanding benodig lineariseering van die tabel struktuur, waar ry of kolom volgorde is kodeerd as 'n onverwagte bias. Soos spurious biases maak die model vulnerable na ry en kolom volgorde perturbasies. In addition, prior work has not thoroughly modeled the table structures of table-text alignments, hindering the table-text understanding ability. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n sterkte en structuraal bekend tabel-teks enkoderingsteks-arkitektuur Tabel Former, waar tabulêre strukturele voorskrifte heeltemal ingevoer word deur leerbare aandag voorskrifte. TabelleFormer is (1) strict invariant to row and column order, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases. Ons evaluasies het vertoon dat Tabel Voriger sterk basisline uitvoer in alle instellings op SQA, WTQ en TabFact tabel redensing datastelle, en bereik status- of- the- art prestasie op SQA, veral wanneer antwoord- invariant ry en kolom volgorde perturbasies gesig is (6% verbetering oor die beste basisline), Omdat vorige Sota modelle se prestasie val deur 4% - 6% wanneer sodanige perturbasies aangesig word terwyl TableFormer nie beïnvloor word nie.", 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i tabelave është një aspekt i rëndësishëm i kuptimit natyror të gjuhës. Modelet ekzistuese për kuptimin e tabelës kërkojnë linearizimin e strukturës së tabelës, ku rendi i radhës apo kolonës është koduar si një paragjykim i padëshiruar. Të tilla paragjykime të shqetësuara e bëjnë modelin të prekshëm ndaj shqetësimeve të rendit të rreshtave dhe kolonave. Përveç kësaj, puna e mëparshme nuk ka modeluar në mënyrë të plotë strukturat e tavolinës apo rregullimet tabelë-teksti, duke penguar aftësinë e kuptimit tabelë-teksti. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një tekst të fortë dhe strukturisht të ndërgjegjshëm në tabelë që kodon arkitekturën TableFormer, ku paragjykimet strukturore tabulare janë përfshirë plotësisht nëpërmjet paragjykimeve të mësueshme të vëmendjes. TableFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases.  Vlerësimet tona treguan se TableFormer kalon linjat bazë të forta në të gjitha rregullimet në SQA, WTQ dhe TabFact tabela të arsyetimit të të dhënave dhe arrin shfaqjen më të lartë në SQA, veçanërisht kur përballet me shqetësimet e rendit të rreshtave dhe kolonave të ndryshme (6% përmirësim mbi bazën më të mirë), Sepse performanca e modeleve të mëparshëm SOTA bie me 4% - 6% kur përballet me shqetësime të tilla ndërsa TableFormer nuk preket.', 'am': 'ጽሑፎችን ማስተዋል የፍጥረተ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል muhimu ነው፡፡ Existing models for table understanding require linearization of the table structure, where row or column order is encoded as an unwanted bias.  እንደዚህ ያሉ ተቃዋሚዎች ምሳሌውን በመስመር እና በዐምድ አርእስት ማቅረብ የሚያስቸኩል ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ አስቀድሞ ሥራ የሠንጠረዥ ሠንጠረዥ ወይም የሠንጠረዥ-ጽሑፍ ክፍተቶችን በመስመር በሙሉ አላደረገም፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የሠንጠረዥ-ጽሑፍ የጽሑፍ ቀለም ማቀናጃ ሠንጠረዥ አካባቢ ተቃውሞ እና የተማረ የሥርዓዊ ግንኙነት በተለየ ትምህርት እውቀት ተቃውሞ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ Former is (1) strictly invalid to row and column orders, and, (2) can understand tables better due to its tabular inductive bias. ምርጫዎቻችን የሠንጠረዥ ቀድሞ SQA፣ WTQ እና TabFact ሠንጠረዥ ላይ የጽኑ መሠረት ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው እና SQA ላይ የልዩ-የ-art ድረ-ስርዓት እንዲደርስ፣ በተለይም በመስጠት ስርዓት እና column order መተላለፊያ ማድረግ ማድረግ እንዲያገኛል (6 በመቶ በላጭ መሠረት ማድረግ ነው), Former', 'hy': 'Understanding tables is an important aspect of natural language understanding.  Գոյություն ունի աղյուսակի հասկանալու մոդելներ, որոնք պահանջում են աղյուսակի կառուցվածքի գծային վերաբերյալ, որտեղ շարքը կամ սյուսակի կարգը կոդավորված է որպես անցանկանալի կողմնականություն: Այսպիսի խիստ կողմնականություններ են դարձնում մոդելը խոցելի շարքերի և սյունների կարգավորման շեղումներին: Ավելին, նախորդ աշխատանքը չի ամբողջովին մոդելավորել աղյուսակի կառուցվածքները կամ աղյուսակի-տեքստի հարմարեցվածքները, ինչը խոչընդոտում է աղյուսակի-տեքստի հասկանալու ունակություն Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ուժեղ և կառուցվածքային առումով գիտակցած սեղանի տեքստի կոդավորումը ճարտարապետական TableForer, որտեղ տախտակների կառուցվածքային կողմնականությունները ամբողջովին ներառվում են սովորելի ուշադր Table Մեր գնահատումները ցույց տվեցին, որ TableExer-ը արտադրում է ուժեղ հիմքային գծեր SQA-ի, wTQ-ի և TabFatt-ի աղյուսակի մտածողական տվյալների համակարգերի բոլոր միջոցներում, և հասնում է SQA-ի ամենաբարձրագույն արդյունքներին, հատկապես երբ հանդիպում է պատասխան-անտարբեր շարքերի և սյունների կարգ Որովհետև նախորդ SOTOA մոդելների արդյունավետությունը նվազում է 4-6 տոկոսով, երբ հանդիպում են նման շեղումների, մինչդեռ TableForer-ը չի ազդում:', 'az': 'MasalarńĪ anlamaq t…ôbii dill…ôrin anlaŇüńĪlmasńĪnńĪn vacib bir aspektidir. S…ôtif…ô anlama modell…ôri s…ôhif…ôl…ôri v…ô s√ľtun sńĪrasńĪ ist…ôm…ôy…ôn t…ôsiri kimi kodlanmńĪŇü s…ôhif…ôl…ôrin s…ôhif…ôl…ôri lazńĪmdńĪr. Bu c√ľrb…ôc√ľr t…ôsirl…ôr modeli s…ôf v…ô s√ľtun sńĪralarńĪna z…ôiflik edir. ∆Źksin…ô, …ôvv…ôlki iŇül…ôr masa qurularńĪnńĪ ya da masa metini t…ôdricl…ôndirm…ôkl…ôri tamamil…ô modell…ôŇüdirm…ômiŇüdir, masa metini anlama qabiliyy…ôtin…ô mane edir. Bu iŇüd…ô, g√ľcl√ľ v…ô strukturlu bil…ôn tabel-metin kodlama arhitektura TableFormer t…ôklif edirik ki, tabullar strukturlu biases tamamil…ô √∂yr…ônib √∂yr…ônm…ôy…ôn t…ôsirl…ôrl…ô birl…ôŇüdirilmiŇüdir. Tabell…ôrFormer (1) s…ôf v…ô s√ľtun …ômrl…ôrin…ô s…ôrt edilm…ôz, v…ô, (2) tabell…ôrini daha yaxŇüńĪ anlayabilir. QńĪymetimiz g√∂st…ôrdi ki, TableFormer SQA, WTQ v…ô TabFact tabell…ôrinin d…ôyiŇüdirilm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn q√ľvv…ôtli s…ôhif…ôl…ôrin d…ôyiŇüdirilm…ôsini g√∂st…ôrir v…ô SQA √ľst√ľnd…ô sanat performansńĪnńĪ baŇüa √ßatdńĪrńĪr, √∂zl…ôrin…ô d…ô cavab-invariant s…ôhif…ôl…ôri v…ô s√ľtun s…ôhif…ôl…ôrin…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüark…ôn (…ôn yaxŇüńĪ s…ôhif…ôl…ôrin √ľst√ľnd…ô 6%-i yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪlńĪr). √á√ľnki …ôvv…ôlki SOTA modell…ôrin performansńĪ 4%-6%-…ô d√ľŇü…ôr, TableFormer t…ôsirl…ônm…ôdikl…ôri halda, b√∂y√ľk f…ôrqli f…ôrqli olaraq √ľz √ßevirir.', 'bn': 'বুঝতে পারছি টেবিল প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝার একটা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দিক। Existing models for table understanding require linearization of the table structure, where row or column order is encoded as an unwanted bias.  এই ধরনের বিদ্রোহীদের মডেল সারি এবং কলামের আদেশের বিরুদ্ধে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত করে। তাছাড়াও, টেবিল-টেক্সট বুঝতে পারার ক্ষমতা বা টেবিল-টেক্সটের স্থানান্তরের পূর্বে কাজ সম্পূর্ণ মডেল করা হয়নি। এই কাজে আমরা একটি রোবটস এবং কাঠামোভাবে পরিচিত টেবিল-টেবিল কোডিং কাঠামো টেবিলের প্রাপ্ত প্রস্তাব করি, যেখানে ট্যাবুলাল কাঠামোর বিভি ট্যাবেলFormer is (1) কঠিন ভাবে সারি এবং কলামের আদেশের জন্য যথাযথ, and, (2) তার টেবিল বুঝতে পারে তার ট্যাবুল ইন্ডারেক্টিভেটিভ ব্যবহ আমাদের মূল্য দেখা যাচ্ছে যে টেবিলের পূর্বে এসকিউএ, উইটিকিউ এবং ট্যাবাফ্যাক্ট ট টেবিলের সকল বৈশিষ্ট্যে শক্তিশালী ভিত্তিক মূল্য প্রদর্শন করে এবং এসকিয়ার রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের প্রতি কারণ পূর্ববর্তী SOTA মডেলের প্রভাব ৪% - ৬% কমে যায় যখন ট্যাবেলের পূর্ববর্তী কোন প্রভাব ফেলে না।', 'ca': "Entendre les taules és un aspecte important de la comprensió natural del llenguatge. Els models existents per entendre la taula requereixen una linearizació de l'estructura de la taula, on l'ordre de filera o columna és codificat com un bias no desitjat. Aquestes tendències esportives fan el model vulnerable a les perturbacions d'ordre de fila i columna. A més, el treball anterior no ha modelat completament les estructures de taula o alliniaments entre text i taula, dificultant la comprensió entre text i taula. En aquesta feina, proposem una codificació robust a i estructuralment conscient del text de taula arquitectura TableFormer, on les tendències estructurals tabulars s'incorporan completament a través de tendències d'atenció aprendibles. TableFormer és (1) estrictament invariant a les ordres de fila i columna, i, (2) podria entendre les taules millor degut a les seves tendències inductives tabulars. Les nostres evaluacions van demostrar que TableFormer supera les línies de referència fortes en tots les configuracions dels conjunts de dades de raonament de taules SQA, WTQ i TabFact, i aconsegueix el desempeny més avançat en SQA, especialment quan s'enfronta a perturbacions d'ordre de fileres i columnes invariants (millora del 6% sobre la millor línia de referència), - perquè el rendiment dels models SOTA anteriors disminueix un 4% - 6% quan s'enfronten a aquestes perturbacions mentre TableFormer no està afectat.", 'cs': 'Porozumění tabulkám je důležitým aspektem porozumění přirozenému jazyku. Stávající modely pro porozumění tabulkám vyžadují linearizaci struktury tabulky, kde je pořadí řádků nebo sloupců kódováno jako nežádoucí předklos. Takové falešné předsudky činí model zranitelným vůči poruchám řádků a sloupců. Navíc předchozí práce nebyly důkladně modelovány struktury tabulky nebo zarovnání tabulky-textu, což bránilo schopnosti porozumět tabulce-textu. V této práci navrhujeme robustní a strukturálně uvědomělou architekturu kódování tabulky a textu TableFormer, kde jsou tabulkové strukturální předsudky zcela začleněny prostřednictvím naučitelných předsudků pozornosti. TableFormer je (1) striktně invariantní k pořadí řádků a sloupců a, (2) by mohl lépe porozumět tabulkám díky svým tabulkovým indukčním předsudkům. Naše hodnocení ukázaly, že TableFormer překonává silné základní linie ve všech nastaveních na datových sadách SQA, WTQ a TabFact a dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu SQA, zejména při narušení pořadí řádků a sloupců invariantních (6% zlepšení nad nejlepším základním základním principem), protože výkon předchozích SOTA modelů klesá o 4,6% když čelí takovým poruchám, zatímco TableFormer není ovlivněn.', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje stolova je važan aspekt razumijevanja prirodnog jezika. Postojeći modeli za razumijevanje stola zahtijevaju linearizaciju strukture stola, gdje je reda ili reda kolona kodirana kao neočekivana predrasuda. Takve tvrdoglave predrasude čine model ranjivim prema redu i redu kolona perturbacijama. Osim toga, prethodni rad nije potpuno modelirao strukture stola ili poravnanje tablovog teksta, što sprječava sposobnost razumijevanja tablovog teksta. U ovom poslu predlažemo snažnu i strukturno svjesnu arhitekturu kodiranja tablica teksta TableFormer, gdje su tabularne strukturne predrasude kompletno uključene putem predrasude pažnje. TablicaFormer je (1) strogo invariant to row and column order, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases. Naša procjena pokazala je da TableFormer iznosi jake osnovne linije u svim postavkama o razmatranju podataka SQA, WTQ i TabFact stola i postigne postignuće postupke umjetnosti na SQA-u, posebno kada se suočavaju s perturbacijama odgovornog invariantnog reda i kolona reda (poboljšanje od 6% nad najboljom osnovnom linijom), Zato što se činjenica prethodnih SOTA modela smanjuje za 4% - 6% kada se suočavaju s takvim perturbacijama dok TableFormer nije uticajan.', 'et': 'Tabelite mõistmine on loodusliku keele mõistmise oluline aspekt. Olemasolevad tabeli mõistmise mudelid nõuavad tabeli struktuuri lineaarsust, kus rea või veeru järjestus on kodeeritud soovimatu kallutamisena. Sellised valelikud kallakud muudavad mudeli haavatavaks rea- ja veerujärjekorra häirete suhtes. Lisaks ei ole varasemates töödes põhjalikult modelleeritud tabelistruktuure ega tabeli-teksti joondusi, mis takistab tabeli-teksti mõistmist. Käesolevas töös pakume välja tugeva ja struktuuriliselt teadliku tabeli-teksti kodeerimise arhitektuuri TableFormer, kus tabelilised struktuurilised kallakud on täielikult integreeritud õppitavate tähelepanu kallakute kaudu. TableFormer on (1) rangelt invariantne rea- ja veergujärjestuste suhtes ning, (2) suudab tabelitest paremini aru saada oma tabelikujuliste induktiivsete kallakute tõttu. Meie hinnangud näitasid, et TableFormer on kõigis SQA, WTQ ja TabFact tabeli põhjendusandmekogumites tugevatest lähtejoontest kõrgem ning saavutab SQA-s tipptasemel jõudluse, eriti kui esineb vastuste invariantseid rea- ja veergujärjekorra häireid (6% paranemine parimast lähtejoonest). kuna varasemate SOTA mudelite jõudlus langeb 4–6% võrra selliste häirete korral, samas kui TableFormer ei mõjuta.', 'fi': 'Taulukoiden ymmärtäminen on tärkeä osa luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämistä. Olemassa olevat taulukon ymmärtämiseen käytettävät mallit edellyttävät taulukon rakenteen lineaaristamista, jossa rivi- tai sarakejärjestys koodataan ei-toivottuna vinona. Tällaiset harhaluulot tekevät mallista haavoittuvan rivien ja sarakkeiden järjestyksen häiriöille. Lisäksi aikaisemmassa työssä ei ole mallinnettu perusteellisesti taulukon rakenteita tai taulukon tekstin tasauksia, mikä vaikeuttaa taulukon tekstin ymmärtämistä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme vankkaa ja rakenteellisesti tietoista taulukkotekstin koodausarkkitehtuuria TableFormer, jossa taulukkorakenteet yhdistetään täysin opittavien huomiovääristymien kautta. TableFormer on (1) täysin invariantti rivi- ja sarakejärjestyksiin, ja, (2) voisi ymmärtää taulukoita paremmin taulukoiden induktiivisten vääristymien vuoksi. Arviointimme osoittivat, että TableFormer suoriutuu kaikista SQA-, WTQ- ja TabFact-taulukon päättelydatasarjoista vahvoja perusviivoja paremmin ja saavuttaa SQA:n huipputason suorituskyvyn erityisesti silloin, kun kohtaat vastaamattomia rivi- ja sarakejärjestyksen häiriöitä (6% parannus parhaaseen perusviivaan verrattuna). Koska aiempien SOTA-mallien suorituskyky laskee 4–6% tällaisissa häiriöissä, kun taas TableFormer ei vaikuta siihen.', 'jv': 'Tulungané tekang-tekang kuwi kapan kuwi kapan kanggo sabanjuré luwih. structural navigation bias Label Nan uwis-uwis rampung dibaya, kita supoyo akeh lan bukasar tentang kanggo ngerasakno tab-text architecture Tableformer, wong liyane tab-structural biases sumulakno ning bokasar tentang kanggo ndelok atimu. former is (1) striectly invariant to row and column order, and (2) can undergo table s Isolahaan nambarang nambarang Tableformer bukane nggawe dataset dadi yang kesalahan kanggo Kemerdekaan sing Kemerdekaan Singh, Wtq lan TabActual politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': "An fahimta dukansu yana da muhimu ga fahimtar harshe na natsi. Ana ƙayyade masallatan wanda ke ƙunsa wa fahimta tabar, ana ƙayyade linjeri na layin, inda an kodi tsarin layin ko layin suna kamar wata tabar da ba'a so. @ info: whatsthis Ƙarawa, aiki na gaba ba ya motsa mazaɓa na saman ko masu daidaita matsayin-tabar, kuma ya kange masu fahimta matsayin-tabar. Former Former is (1) strictly inaccessible to rows and Column Orders, and, (2) can get the tabulas mafi alhẽri owa to its tabular inductic abilities. Ana ƙaddara kananmu ya nũna cẽwa TableFormer outperforms stroke base lines cikin duk settings on SQA, WTQ da TabFact tabar masu hankali da data, kuma yana sãmun state-of-the-art on SQA, hususan idan sun haɗi ranar-inganci da tsarin layuka na layin suna (6% improvement over the best line), @ info: whatsthis", 'sk': 'Razumevanje tabel je pomemben vidik razumevanja naravnega jezika. Obstoječi modeli za razumevanje tabel zahtevajo linearizacijo strukture tabele, kjer je vrstni red vrstic ali stolpcev kodiran kot neželena pristranskost. Takšne lažne pristranskosti naredijo model ranljiv na motnje vrstic in stolpcev. Poleg tega predhodno delo ni temeljito modeliralo struktur tabel ali poravnave tabele-besedilo, kar ovira sposobnost razumevanja tabele-besedilo. V tem delu predlagamo robustno in strukturno ozaveščeno arhitekturo kodiranja tabele-besedila TableFormer, kjer so tabele strukturne pristranskosti popolnoma vključene skozi naučljive pristranskosti. TableFormer je (1) strogo invariant za vrstice in stolpce vrstni red, in, (2) bi lahko bolje razumel tabele zaradi svojih induktivnih pristranskosti tabele. Naše ocene so pokazale, da TableFormer presega močne izhodiščne vrstice v vseh nastavitvah sklopov podatkov o razmišljanju tabele SQA, WTQ in TabFact ter dosega najsodobnejšo učinkovitost pri SQA, zlasti če se soočamo z motnjami vrstnega reda vrstic in stolpcev z invariantnimi odgovori (6-odstotno izboljšanje v primerjavi z najboljšo osnovno vrednostjo), ker se zmogljivost prejšnjih modelov SOTA zmanjša za 4–6%, ko se soočajo s takimi motnjami, medtem ko TableFormer ne vpliva na to.', 'he': 'להבין שולחנות הוא היבט חשוב של הבנה טבעית לשפה. דוגמנים קיימים להבנה שולחן דורשים לינריזציה של מבנה השולחן, שבו שורה או עמוד מסדר מוצפנים כחיזוק לא רצוי. ההתמחות המעוררות האלה גורמות לדוגמא פגיעה לפרעות בשורה ולעמוד. בנוסף, העבודה הקודמת לא דגמה באופן יסודי את מבני השולחן או התאמות טקסט-שולחן, ומחסכת את יכולת הבנה טקסט-שולחן. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים קודם טקסט שולחן-טקסט חזק ומודע מבחינה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מבנה מב TableFormer is (1) strictly invariant to row and column orders, and, (2) could understand tables better due to its tabular inductive biases.  הערכות שלנו הראו שTableFormer עולה על קווי בסיס חזקים בכל ההגדרות על SQA, WTQ ושולחן TabFact קבוצות מידע הגיוני, ומשגש ביצועים מוקדמים על SQA, במיוחד כאשר מתמודדים עם הפרעות בשורה והעמוד הפריצות (שיפור של 6% מעל קווי הסיס הטוב ביותר), בגלל שהביצועים של דוגמנים קודמים של SOTA נופלים ב-4% - 6% כאשר מתמודדים עם הפרעות כאלה בעוד TableFormer לא משפיע.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་གལ་ཆེ་ཤིག་ཡིན། Existing models for table understanding require linearization of the table structure, where row or column order is encoded as an unwanted bias. དབྱེ་རིམ་འདི་དག་གི་འགྱུར་མཁན་དེ་གྲལ་ཐིག་དང་གྱེན་ཕྲེང་གི་གོ་རིམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བཟོ་རྣམ། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་ཐིག་ཁྲམ་གྱི་བཟོ་བཀོད་དང་ཐིག་ཁྲམ་གྱི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྣམས་ལས་ཕན་མེད་པ་ཡིན། In this work, we propose a robust and structurally aware table-text encoding architecture TableFormer, where tabular structural biases are incorporated completely through learnable attention biases. Tab Our evaluations showed that TableFormer outperforms strong baselines in all settings on SQA, WTQ and TabFact table reasoning datasets, and achieves state-of-the-art performance on SQA, especially when facing answer-invariant row and column order perturbations (6% improvement over the best baseline), གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། སྔོན་གྱི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་མཐའ་འགྱུར་ཚད་འདི་དག་གི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་སྐབས་'}
{'en': 'A Meta-framework for Spatiotemporal Quantity Extraction from Text', 'ar': 'إدراك العالم: التعلم المعزز الموجه بالأسئلة للألعاب النصية', 'fr': 'Percevoir le monde\xa0: apprentissage par renforcement guidé par des questions pour les jeux textuels', 'es': 'Percibir el mundo: aprendizaje por refuerzo guiado por preguntas para juegos basados en texto', 'pt': 'Percebendo o mundo: Aprendizado por reforço guiado por perguntas para jogos baseados em texto', 'ja': '世界を知覚する：テキストベースのゲームのための質問誘導型強化学習', 'zh': '感知世界:文本强化', 'hi': 'दुनिया को समझना: पाठ-आधारित खेलों के लिए प्रश्न-निर्देशित सुदृढीकरण सीखना', 'ru': 'Восприятие мира: обучение подкреплению на основе вопросов для текстовых игр', 'ga': 'Ag Breathnú ar an Domhan: Foghlaim Neartú Ceist-threoraithe le haghaidh Cluichí Téacsbhunaithe', 'ka': 'მსოფლიოს პროცენტი: ტექსტის დაბათებული თამაშებისთვის სწავლება კითხვების მიხედვით', 'hu': 'A világ észlelése: kérdések alapján megerősített tanulás szöveges alapú játékokhoz', 'el': 'Κατανόηση του Κόσμου: Μάθηση Ενίσχυσης με γνώμονα τις ερωτήσεις για Παιχνίδια με βάση το κείμενο', 'it': 'Percepire il mondo: apprendimento di rinforzo guidato dalle domande per i giochi basati su testo', 'kk': 'Дүйнің пайызы: Мәтін негіздеген ойындар үшін сұрақтар көмектесілген оқу', 'mk': 'Перцепирање на светот: Појачување на училиштето за текстови игри насочено со прашања', 'lt': 'Pasaulio suvokimas: klausimais pagrįstas mokymasis stiprinti žaidimus tekstu', 'ms': 'Perceiving the World: Question-guided Reinforcement Learning for Text-based Games', 'ml': 'ലോകത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു: പദാവലി അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന കളികള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Дэлхийг хуваалцах нь: Текст суурь тоглоомын тулд асуулт удирдлагатай', 'mt': 'Il-Perċezzjoni tad-Dinja: Tagħlim imsaħħaħ ibbażat fuq il-mistoqsijiet għal Logħob ibbażat fuq it-Test', 'pl': 'Postrzeganie świata: nauka wzmacniająca kierowana pytaniami dla gier tekstowych', 'no': 'Prosensjon av verden: Oppgåvehandteringsforstørringar for tekstbasert spel', 'ro': 'Percepționarea lumii: Învățare de consolidare bazată pe întrebări pentru jocurile bazate pe text', 'sr': 'Procentiranje sveta: Pojačanje učenja na pitanju za igre na tekstu', 'ta': 'உலகத்தை செயல்படுத்துகிறது: உரை அடிப்படையான விளையாட்டுகளுக்கு கேள்வி நேர்வழி காட்டப்பட்டுள்ள தகவல்', 'sv': 'Upplev världen: frågestyrd förstärkning av lärande för textbaserade spel', 'so': 'Perceding World: Question-guided Reinforcement Learning for Text-based Games', 'si': 'ලෝකය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: ප්\u200dරශ්නය- ප්\u200dරශ්නය- ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ආධාරිත සෙල්ලම් ව', 'ur': 'دنیا کی پریشانی: سوال کی ہدایت کی ہدایت پاکستان بنیادی کھیل کے لئے سیکھنے', 'vi': 'Nhận thức thế giới: học tiếp sức của câu hỏi cho cuộc thi văn bản', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Разбиране на света: обучение за подсилване с въпроси за текстово базирани игри', 'hr': 'Procentiranje svijeta: učenje pojačanja na pitanju za igre na tekstu', 'nl': 'De wereld waarnemen: op vragen gebaseerde versterking leren voor tekstgebaseerde spellen', 'da': 'Opfattelse af verden: Spørgsmålstegnet forstærkelseslæring for tekstbaserede spil', 'de': 'Die Welt wahrnehmen: Fragengesteuertes Verstärkungslernen für textbasierte Spiele', 'ko': '감지 세계: 텍스트 게임 기반 문제 유도 강화 학습', 'fa': 'تقسیم جهان: یادگیری که بر روی بازی های متن راهنمایی به سوال می\u200cکند', 'id': 'Perceiving the World: Question-guided Reinforcement Learning for Text-based Games', 'sw': 'Kutekeleza dunia: Swali linaloongozwa na Mafunzo kwa ajili ya michezo yanayotokana na maandishi', 'tr': 'Dünýä jemgyýetişdirmek: Metin tabanly Oýunlar üçin soraglary guruldyrylýan Ködleme', 'af': 'Verdelering van die wêreld: vraag-gidse versterking leer vir teksbaseerde speletjies', 'sq': 'Percepting the World: Question-guided Reinforcement Learning for Text-based Games', 'am': 'አዲስ ጨዋታ', 'hy': 'Համաշխարհի ընկալելը. հարցերի ուղղությամբ ուժեղացված ուսումնասիրությունը տեքստի հիմնված խաղերի համար', 'az': 'Dünyanın hökmünü təşkil edir: Mətn tabanlı Oyunların öyrənməsi', 'bn': 'বিশ্বের প্রতিষ্ঠান: টেক্সট ভিত্তিক খেলার জন্য প্রশ্ন-পরিচালিত পুনর্গঠন শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে', 'ca': 'Percebir el món: Aprendència de reforç orientada per preguntes pels jocs basats en text', 'cs': 'Vnímání světa: Otázkové posilovací učení pro textové hry', 'bs': 'Procentiranje svijeta: Pojačanje učenja na pitanju za utakmice na tekstu', 'et': 'Maailma tajumine: küsimustele suunatud tugevdamisõpe tekstipõhiste mängude jaoks', 'fi': 'Maailman hahmottaminen: Kysymys-ohjattu vahvistuksen oppiminen tekstipohjaisiin peleihin', 'jv': 'Ngawe Percent', 'sk': 'Dojemanje sveta: z vprašanji vodeno okrepitveno učenje za besedilne igre', 'he': 'Perceiving the World: Question-guided Reinforcement Learning for Text-based Games', 'ha': 'Perceivering World: Issuwa wanda aka shiryar da Infusion Learn wa Games na Text-based', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་གི་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བཞིན་པ། དྲི་ཚིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞི་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་བསླབ་ནུས་མཐུན་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'News events are often associated with quantities (e.g., the number of COVID-19 patients or the number of arrests in a protest), and it is often important to extract their type, time, and location from unstructured text in order to analyze these quantity events. This paper thus formulates the NLP problem of spatiotemporal quantity extraction, and proposes the first meta-framework for solving it. This meta-framework contains a formalism that decomposes the problem into several information extraction tasks, a shareable crowdsourcing pipeline, and transformer-based baseline models. We demonstrate the meta-framework in three domains—the COVID-19 pandemic, Black Lives Matter protests, and 2020 California wildfires—to show that the formalism is general and extensible, the crowdsourcing pipeline facilitates fast and high-quality data annotation, and the baseline system can handle spatiotemporal quantity extraction well enough to be practically useful. We release all resources for future research on this topic at https://github.com/steqe.', 'ar': 'توفر الألعاب القائمة على النصوص طريقة تفاعلية لدراسة معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. بينما أظهر التعلم المعزز العميق فعاليته في تطوير عامل اللعب ، تظل كفاءة العينة المنخفضة ومساحة العمل الكبيرة التحديين الرئيسيين اللذين يعوقان تطبيق DRL في العالم الحقيقي. في هذه الورقة ، نتصدى للتحديات من خلال تقديم وحدات إدراكية للعالم ، والتي تعمل تلقائيًا على تحليل المهام وتقليم الإجراءات من خلال الإجابة على الأسئلة المتعلقة بالبيئة. ثم نقترح إطارًا تدريبيًا من مرحلتين لفصل تعلم اللغة عن التعلم المعزز ، مما يؤدي إلى زيادة تحسين كفاءة العينة. أظهرت النتائج التجريبية أن الطريقة المقترحة تحسن الأداء وكفاءة العينة بشكل كبير. إلى جانب ذلك ، فإنه يُظهر متانة ضد الخطأ المركب وبيانات محدودة قبل التدريب.', 'pt': 'Os jogos baseados em texto fornecem uma maneira interativa de estudar o processamento de linguagem natural. Embora o aprendizado por reforço profundo tenha mostrado eficácia no desenvolvimento do agente de jogo, a baixa eficiência da amostra e o grande espaço de ação continuam sendo os dois principais desafios que impedem a aplicação do DRL no mundo real. Neste artigo, abordamos os desafios introduzindo módulos de percepção do mundo, que decompõem automaticamente tarefas e podam ações respondendo a perguntas sobre o meio ambiente. Em seguida, propomos uma estrutura de treinamento de duas fases para dissociar o aprendizado de idiomas do aprendizado por reforço, o que melhora ainda mais a eficiência da amostra. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o método proposto melhora significativamente o desempenho e a eficiência da amostra. Além disso, mostra robustez contra erros compostos e dados pré-treinamento limitados.', 'fr': "Les jeux textuels offrent un moyen interactif d'étudier le traitement du langage naturel. Bien que l'apprentissage par renforcement profond ait démontré son efficacité dans le développement de l'agent de jeu, la faible efficacité de l'échantillon et le grand espace d'action restent les deux principaux défis qui empêchent l'application de la DRL dans le monde réel. Dans cet article, nous abordons les défis en introduisant des modules de perception du monde, qui décomposent automatiquement les tâches et élaguent les actions en répondant à des questions sur l'environnement. Nous proposons ensuite un cadre de formation en deux phases pour dissocier l'apprentissage des langues de l'apprentissage par renforcement, ce qui améliore encore l'efficacité de l'échantillon. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que la méthode proposée améliore considérablement les performances et l'efficacité de l'échantillon. En outre, il montre une robustesse face aux erreurs composées et des données pré-entraînement limitées.", 'es': 'Los juegos basados en texto ofrecen una forma interactiva de estudiar el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Si bien el aprendizaje por refuerzo profundo ha demostrado eficacia en el desarrollo del agente de juego, la baja eficiencia de la muestra y el gran espacio de acción siguen siendo los dos desafíos principales que impiden que la DRL se aplique en el mundo real. En este artículo, abordamos los desafíos mediante la introducción de módulos que perciben el mundo, que descomponen automáticamente las tareas y recortan las acciones respondiendo a preguntas sobre el medio ambiente. A continuación, proponemos un marco de capacitación en dos fases para separar el aprendizaje de idiomas del aprendizaje por refuerzo, lo que mejora aún más la eficiencia de la muestra. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el método propuesto mejora significativamente el rendimiento y la eficiencia de la muestra. Además, muestra robustez contra errores compuestos y datos limitados de preentrenamiento.', 'ja': 'テキストベースのゲームは、自然言語処理を研究するためのインタラクティブな方法を提供します。深い強化学習は、ゲームプレイエージェントの開発における有効性を示しているが、サンプル効率の低さと広いアクションスペースは、DRLが現実世界に適用されることを妨げる2つの主要な課題であり続けている。本稿では、環境に関する質問に答えることでタスクを自動的に分解し、アクションを刈り取る世界感覚モジュールを導入することで、課題に対処する。そして、言語学習を強化学習から切り離すための2段階のトレーニングフレームワークを提案し、サンプル効率をさらに向上させます。実験結果は、提案された方法がパフォーマンスとサンプル効率を著しく向上させることを示している。さらに、化合物エラーに対する堅牢性と限られた事前トレーニングデータを示しています。', 'zh': '盖文本之戏,供一学自然语言理之交互式也。 虽深化学于开戏之代已见有效性,而卑样本效率大动空间犹阻DRL于世界中应用二要。 本文者,所以入世感模块以应之,模块以境自解而修之也。 然后发一两段训练框架,将言语学习脱钩,进一步提高了样本效率。 实验结果表明,宜著样品性效率。 又示出对差有限之鲁棒性。', 'ru': 'Текстовые игры предоставляют интерактивный способ изучения обработки естественного языка. В то время как глубокое обучение подкреплению показало эффективность в разработке игрового агента, низкая эффективность выборки и большое пространство действий остаются двумя основными проблемами, которые мешают применению ДХО в реальном мире. В настоящем документе мы рассматриваем проблемы путем внедрения воспринимающих мир модулей, которые автоматически декомпозируют задачи и обрезают действия, отвечая на вопросы об окружающей среде. Затем мы предлагаем двухэтапную систему обучения, чтобы отделить изучение языка от обучения подкреплению, что  дополнительно повышает эффективность выборки. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый метод значительно повышает производительность и эффективность образца. Кроме того, он демонстрирует устойчивость к погрешности соединения и ограниченные данные предварительного обучения.', 'hi': 'पाठ-आधारित गेम प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण का अध्ययन करने के लिए एक इंटरैक्टिव तरीका प्रदान करते हैं। जबकि गहरी सुदृढीकरण सीखने ने गेम प्लेइंग एजेंट को विकसित करने में प्रभावशीलता दिखाई है, कम नमूना दक्षता और बड़ी कार्रवाई की जगह दो प्रमुख चुनौतियां बनी हुई हैं जो वास्तविक दुनिया में लागू होने से डीआरएल को बाधित करती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम दुनिया-समझने वाले मॉड्यूल को पेश करके चुनौतियों को संबोधित करते हैं, जो पर्यावरण के बारे में सवालों के जवाब देकर स्वचालित रूप से कार्यों को विघटित करते हैं और कार्यों को काटते हैं। फिर हम सुदृढीकरण सीखने से भाषा सीखने को कम करने के लिए एक दो-चरण प्रशिक्षण ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो नमूना दक्षता में और सुधार करता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि प्रदर्शन और नमूना दक्षता में काफी सुधार करती है। इसके अलावा, यह यौगिक त्रुटि और सीमित पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण डेटा के खिलाफ मजबूती दिखाता है।', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn cluichí téacsbhunaithe bealach idirghníomhach chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha. Cé gur léirigh foghlaim athneartaithe domhain éifeachtacht i bhforbairt an ghníomhaire imeartha cluiche, tá an éifeachtacht samplach íseal agus an spás gníomhaíochta mór fós ar an dá dhúshlán mór a chuireann bac ar an DRL a chur i bhfeidhm sa saol fíor. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar na dúshláin trí mhodúil dhomhanda a thabhairt isteach, a dhíscaoileann tascanna go huathoibríoch agus a ghearrann gníomhartha trí cheisteanna a fhreagairt faoin gcomhshaol. Molaimid ansin creat oiliúna dhá chéim chun foghlaim teanga a dhíchúpláil ó fhoghlaim athneartaithe, rud a fheabhsaíonn éifeachtacht an tsampla a thuilleadh. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfeabhsaíonn an modh atá beartaithe go mór an fheidhmíocht agus an éifeachtúlacht sampla. Thairis sin, léiríonn sé stóinseacht i gcoinne earráide cumaisc agus sonraí réamhoiliúna teoranta.', 'ka': 'ტექსტიური თამაშები ინტერქექტიური გზების პროცესის შესწავლობა. მაგრამ ძალიან სწავლებელი სწავლება გამოიყენება იქნება ეფექტიურობა თამაში თამაში თამაშების ადვნენტის განვითარებაში, მარტივი მონაცემების ეფექტიურობა და დიდი მოქმედების ადგილა დარჩენება ორი მნი ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სამყაროს მოდულების შესახებ, რომლებიც ავტომატურად დავამუშავებენ დავალებები და დავაკეთებენ მოქმედებები, რომლებიც სამყაროს შესახებ კ შემდეგ ჩვენ მუშაობთ ორ ფეზის განაკლების ფრამეტრი, რომელიც უფრო სწავლებელიდან ენის სწავლების განაკოლუცია, რომელიც უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტადებს ჩ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ პროგენტირებული მეტი მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო მეტადებს პროგენტირება და გამოსახულების ეფე დამატებით, ის ჩვენებს ძალიან შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის და დასაწყებული საუკეთესო შეცდომის მონაცემები.', 'hu': 'A szöveges alapú játékok interaktív módot nyújtanak a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás tanulmányozására. Míg a mélyreható erősítési tanulás hatékonyságot mutatott a játék ügynök fejlesztésében, az alacsony mintahatékonyság és a nagy akcióterület továbbra is a két fő kihívás, amelyek gátolják a DRL alkalmazását a valós világban. Ebben a tanulmányban világérzékelő modulok bevezetésével foglalkozunk a kihívásokkal, amelyek automatikusan lebontják a feladatokat és a környezettel kapcsolatos kérdések megválaszolásával levágják a tevékenységeket. Ezt követően kétfázisú képzési keretrendszert javasolunk a nyelvtanulás és a megerősítő tanulás leválasztására, ami tovább javítja a minta hatékonyságát. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer jelentősen javítja a teljesítményt és a minta hatékonyságát. Emellett robusztusságot mutat az összetett hibákkal szemben és korlátozott edzési adatokat mutat.', 'el': 'Τα παιχνίδια με βάση το κείμενο παρέχουν έναν διαδραστικό τρόπο μελέτης της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ενώ η βαθιά μάθηση ενίσχυσης έχει δείξει αποτελεσματικότητα στην ανάπτυξη του παράγοντα παιχνιδιού, η χαμηλή αποδοτικότητα του δείγματος και ο μεγάλος χώρος δράσης παραμένουν οι δύο μεγάλες προκλήσεις που εμποδίζουν την εφαρμογή του στον πραγματικό κόσμο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, αντιμετωπίζουμε τις προκλήσεις εισάγοντας ενότητες αντίληψης του κόσμου, οι οποίες αποσυντίθενται αυτόματα τις εργασίες και περικόπτουν τις ενέργειες απαντώντας σε ερωτήσεις σχετικά με το περιβάλλον. Στη συνέχεια, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο κατάρτισης δύο φάσεων για να αποσυνδέσουμε την εκμάθηση γλωσσών από την ενισχυτική μάθηση, γεγονός που βελτιώνει περαιτέρω την αποτελεσματικότητα του δείγματος. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βελτιώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση και την αποδοτικότητα του δείγματος. Εκτός αυτού, δείχνει ανθεκτικότητα ενάντια στο σύνθετο σφάλμα και τα περιορισμένα δεδομένα προ-κατάρτισης.', 'it': "I giochi basati su testo forniscono un modo interattivo per studiare l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Mentre l'apprendimento profondo del rinforzo ha dimostrato l'efficacia nello sviluppo dell'agente di gioco, la bassa efficienza del campione e l'ampio spazio d'azione rimangono le due principali sfide che ostacolano l'applicazione del DRL nel mondo reale. In questo articolo affrontiamo le sfide introducendo moduli che percepiscono il mondo, che scompongono automaticamente i compiti e potano le azioni rispondendo alle domande sull'ambiente. Proponiamo quindi un quadro di formazione in due fasi per separare l'apprendimento delle lingue dall'apprendimento di rinforzo, che migliora ulteriormente l'efficienza del campione. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il metodo proposto migliora significativamente le prestazioni e l'efficienza del campione. Inoltre, mostra robustezza contro errori composti e dati limitati pre-allenamento.", 'lt': 'Tekstiniai žaidimai yra interaktyvus būdas mokytis natūralaus kalbų apdorojimo. Nors gilus stiprinimo mokymasis parodė veiksmingumą plėtojant žaidimų veiksnį, mažas bandinių veiksmingumas ir didelė veiksmų erdvė tebėra dvi pagrindinės problemos, trukdančios DRL taikyti realiame pasaulyje. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame uždavinius įvedant pasaulio požiūriu suvokiančius modulius, kurie automatiškai atskiria užduotis ir mažina veiksmus atsakydami į klausimus apie aplinką. Tuomet pasiūlysime dviejų etapų mokymo sistemą, kad kalbų mokymasis būtų atsietas nuo mokymosi stiprinimo, o tai toliau gerintų mėginių veiksmingumą. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gerokai pagerina veiklos rezultatus ir bandinių veiksmingumą. Be to, jame parodomas tvirtas sudėtinių klaidų ir riboti ikimokymo duomenys.', 'mk': 'Text-based games provide an interactive way to study natural language processing.  Иако длабокото зајакнување на учењето покажа ефикасност во развојот на агентот за игра на игрите, ниската ефикасност на примероците и големиот простор за акција остануваат двата главни предизвици кои го попречуваат спроведувањето на ДРЛ во реалниот свет. Во овој документ, ги решаваме предизвиците со воведување на модули за светска перцепција, кои автоматски ги раскинуваат задачите и ги намалуваат акциите со одговор на прашањата за животната средина. Потоа предложуваме двофазиска рамка за обука за одвојување на учењето на јазикот од зајакнување на учењето, што понатаму ја подобрува ефикасноста на примероците. The experimental results show that the proposed method significantly improves the performance and sample efficiency.  Покрај тоа, покажува силност против комплексната грешка и ограничени податоци за предобука.', 'mt': 'Il-logħob ibbażat fuq it-test jipprovdi mod interattiv biex jiġi studjat l-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Filwaqt li tagħlim profond ta’ rinfurzar wera effettività fl-iżvilupp tal-aġent tal-logħob, l-effiċjenza baxxa tal-kampjuni u l-ispazju l-kbir ta’ azzjoni għadhom iż-żewġ sfidi ewlenin li jfixklu l-applikazzjoni tad-DRL fid-dinja reali. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw l-isfidi billi nintroduċu moduli ta’ perċezzjoni dinjija, li awtomatikament jiddekomponu l-kompiti u jnaqqsu l-azzjonijiet billi nwieġbu mistoqsijiet dwar l-ambjent. Imbagħad nipproponu qafas ta’ taħriġ f’żewġ fażijiet biex it-tagħlim tal-lingwi jiġi diżakkoppjat mit-tagħlim ta’ tisħiħ, li “ jkompli jtejjeb l-effiċjenza tal-kampjun. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu propost itejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni u l-effiċjenza tal-kampjun. Barra minn hekk, juri robustezza kontra żbalji komposti u dejta limitata ta’ qabel it-taħriġ.', 'ms': 'Text-based games provide an interactive way to study natural language processing.  Sementara pembelajaran kuasa dalam menunjukkan keefektivitas dalam mengembangkan ejen permainan permainan, keefektivitas sampel rendah dan ruang tindakan besar tetap menjadi dua cabaran utama yang menghalangi DRL daripada dilaksanakan di dunia nyata. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi cabaran dengan memperkenalkan modul yang menyaksikan dunia, yang secara automatik memutuskan tugas dan tindakan mengukir dengan menjawab soalan tentang persekitaran. Kemudian kami cadangan latihan dua fasa untuk menyambungkan pembelajaran bahasa dari pembelajaran kuasa, yang lebih meningkatkan efisiensi sampel. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan meningkatkan prestasi dan efisiensi sampel secara signifikan. Selain itu, ia menunjukkan kekuatan terhadap ralat komponen dan data praselatihan terbatas.', 'ml': 'പദാവലി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ കളികള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്രക്രിയയെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു  കളിയാക്കുന്ന ഏജന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ലോകത്തെ മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന ഘടകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. അത് പര പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു രണ്ട് ഫേസ് ട്രെയിനിന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഭാഷ കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും  പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെയും മാമ്പിളിന്റെ അതിനു ശേഷം, അത് കൂടുതല്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായുള്ള തെറ്റിനെയും പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമുമ്പ് പരിശീല', 'no': 'Tekstbasert spel gjev eit interaktiv måte å studera naturspråkshandtering. Mens læring av dypt reinforcement har vist effektivt i å utvikla spelprogrammet, vil det låge utvalet og det store handlingsplassen bli det to store utfordringane som hindrar DRL å bruka i verkeleg verda. I denne papiret vert vi oppretta utfordringane ved å introdusera verdenspåverka modular, som automatisk dekomprimerer oppgåver og prøver handlingar ved å svara på spørsmål om miljøet. Vi foreslår så eit to-fådsøvingsrammeverk for å dekomplisera språk-læring frå stipringslæring, som forbetrar utvalet. Eksperimentale resultatene viser at den foreslåde metoden betydelig forbedrar effektiviteten og utvalet. I tillegg viser det kraftighet mot samlingsfeil og begrenset føreøvingsdata.', 'mn': 'Текст суурилсан тоглоомууд байгалийн хэл процессийг судлах интерактив арга хангадаг. Хэдийгээр гүн гүнзгий нэмэлт суралцах нь тоглоомын агентын хөгжлийн үр дүнг харуулсан ч, жинхэнэ дэлхий дээр ДРЛ-г хэрэгжүүлэхийг зогсоох хоёр чухал асуудал болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид дэлхийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөж байгаа модульуудыг автоматаар ажлыг хуваалцаж, орчин орчины талаар асуудлыг хариулж буй үйл ажиллагааг тодорхойлох сорилтуудыг удирддаг. Дараа нь бид хоёр дахь дахь сургалтын хөгжлийн сургалтыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд хоёр дахь дасгал сургалтын хөтөлбөр сургалтыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь шалгалтын үр дүнг илүү сайжру Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь үйл ажиллагаа, жишээлбэлийн үр дүнг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Энэ нь холбоотой алдаа болон хэмжээний сургалтын мэдээллийн эсрэг хүчтэй байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Gry tekstowe zapewniają interaktywny sposób studiowania przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Podczas gdy uczenie się głębokiego wzmocnienia wykazało skuteczność w opracowywaniu środka gry, niska wydajność próbek i duża przestrzeń działania pozostają dwoma głównymi wyzwaniami, które utrudniają stosowanie DRL w świecie rzeczywistym. W niniejszym artykule podejmujemy wyzwania poprzez wprowadzenie modułów postrzegania świata, które automatycznie rozkładają zadania i przycinają działania odpowiadając na pytania dotyczące środowiska. Następnie proponujemy dwufazowe ramy szkoleniowe, aby oddzielić naukę języków od uczenia się wzmacniającego, co jeszcze bardziej poprawia efektywność prób. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowana metoda znacznie poprawia wydajność próbek. Poza tym wykazuje solidność przed błędami złożonymi i ograniczonymi danymi przedtreningowymi.', 'ro': 'Jocurile pe bază de text oferă o modalitate interactivă de a studia procesarea limbajului natural. În timp ce învățarea profundă de consolidare a demonstrat eficiență în dezvoltarea agentului de joc, eficiența scăzută a eșantionului și spațiul mare de acțiune rămân cele două provocări majore care împiedică aplicarea DRL în lumea reală. În această lucrare, abordăm provocările prin introducerea unor module care percep lumea, care descompun automat sarcinile și taie acțiunile răspunzând la întrebări despre mediu. Propunem apoi un cadru de formare în două faze pentru a decupla învățarea limbilor străine de învățarea consolidată, ceea ce îmbunătățește și mai mult eficiența eșantionului. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda propusă îmbunătățește semnificativ performanța și eficiența eșantionului. În plus, arată robustețe împotriva erorilor compuse și date limitate pre-antrenament.', 'sr': 'Igre na tekstu pružaju interaktivan naèin za prouèavanje prirodnog jezika. Iako je učenje dubokog pojačanja pokazalo učinkovitost u razvoju igračkog agenta, niska učinkovitost uzorka i veliki prostor akcije ostala dva velika izazova koje sprječavaju da se DRL primjenjuje u stvarnom svijetu. U ovom papiru rješavamo izazove uvođenjem svijetskih modula koji automatski raspoređuju zadatke i pružaju akcije odgovarajući na pitanja o okruženju. Onda predlažemo okvir treninga na dve faze kako bi se rasključio učenje jezika iz učenja pojačanja, što će i dalje poboljšati učinkovitost uzorka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda značajno poboljšava učinkovitost izvođenja i uzoraka. Osim toga, pokazuje snagu protiv povezanih grešaka i ograničenih podataka pre obuke.', 'so': "Ciyaar ku saleysan qoraal ah waxay bixiyaan qaab aad u faa’iideysan karto baaraandegista luqada asalka ah. Intii waxbarashada aad u dheer uu muujiyey faa’iido horumarinta maamulka ciyaarta, faa’iidada hoos u ah samoolka samooyinka iyo goobta waxqabadka badnaana waxay ahaanayaan labada dhibaatooyin oo muhiimka ah oo ka hor jeediya DRL in lagu codsado aduunka runta ah. Warqaddan waxaynu ku sheekaynaa dhibaatooyinka lagu soo bandhigayo noocyada garashada dunida, taas oo si automatic ah u duminaya shaqaalaha iyo waxqabadka nadiifsan si ay ugu jawaabaan su'aalo ku saabsan deegaanka. Markaas waxaynu horumarinaynaa kooras waxbarasho oo laba fasax ah si aan u fududayno waxbarashada afka si aad u barato waxbarashada horumarinta, taas oo u sii kordhiya awoodda sameynta. Midhaha imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in qaababka la soo jeeday uu si weyn u kordhiyo awoodda sameynta iyo sameynta. Besides, it shows robustness against compound error and limited pre-training data.", 'kk': 'Мәтін негіздеген ойындар табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін интерактивті тәртібін береді. Ойын ойнату агентін жасау үшін дұрыс жақсарту оқыту мүмкіндігін көрсетіп тұрғанда, үлкен әрекеттер үлкен әрекеттер және үлкен әрекеттер орындалығы шын әлемдегі ДРЛ қолдануды басқаратын екі нег Бұл қағазда, әлемді түсінікті модульдерді келтіріп, тапсырмаларды автоматты түрде бөліп, орта туралы сұрақтарды жауап беру арқылы әрекеттерді көшірмелейміз. Содан кейін біз тілді оқыту үйренімізді күштеу оқыту үшін екі этап оқыту бағдарламасын ұсынамыз. Бұл үлгілердің еффективнігін жасайды. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер таңдалған әдістер әрекетті және үлгі нәтижесін өзгертеді. Қосымша, бұл біріктірілген қатеге қарсы және біріктірілген алдын- оқыту деректеріне шектелген қуатты көрсетеді.', 'sv': 'Textbaserade spel ger ett interaktivt sätt att studera naturlig språkbehandling. Även om djupinlärning av förstärkning har visat effektivitet i utvecklingen av spelmedlet, är den låga urvalseffektiviteten och det stora handlingsutrymmet fortfarande de två stora utmaningarna som hindrar DRL från att tillämpas i den verkliga världen. I denna uppsats tar vi itu med utmaningarna genom att introducera världspercepande moduler, som automatiskt bryter ned uppgifter och beskärnar åtgärder genom att svara på frågor om miljön. Vi föreslår sedan en tvåfas utbildningsram för att skilja språkinlärning från förstärkt lärande, vilket ytterligare förbättrar urvalseffektiviteten. De experimentella resultaten visar att den föreslagna metoden avsevärt förbättrar prestanda och proveffektivitet. Dessutom visar den robusthet mot sammansatta fel och begränsad pre-training data.', 'si': 'පාට්ස් ආධාරිත සෙල්ලම් ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න සම්බන්ධ විදියට සම්බන්ධ සෙල්ලම් නියෝජිත විශ්වාසයෙන් විස්තර කරන්න ගොඩක් විශ්වාසය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, අඩු සැම්පල් විශ්වාසය ස මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා ලෝකය හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නය පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව ඊට පස්සේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා භාෂාව ඉගෙනගන්න, ඒක තවත්  පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශේෂය සහ සැමැල ඒ වගේම, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ සංවිධාන වැරදි සහ ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ශක්තිමතාව.', 'ta': 'உரை அடிப்படையிலான விளையாட்டு ஆழமான கல்விப்பாடு விளையாட்டு முகவரியை உருவாக்கும் போது, குறைந்த மாதிரி விளையாட்டு விளையாட்டு விளையாட்டு விளையாட்டு செயல்பாட்டு வெள இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் உலக புரிந்து கொள்ளும் கூறுகளை முதலில் சவால்களை விளைவாக்குகிறோம், அது சூழல் பற்றிய கேள்விகளை பதில் கூறு பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு இரண்டு நிலை பயிற்சி சட்டத்திற்கு முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் மொழி கற்றத்தை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, அது மாதிரி செயல்பா The experimental results show that the proposed method significantly improves the performance and sample efficiency.  அதற்கும் மேலும், அது கூடுதல் பிழையை எதிர்காண்பிக்கும் மற்றும் முன் பயிற்சி தகவல் வரம்பு உள்ளது.', 'ur': 'پاکستان بنیادی کھیل نے طبیعی زبان پرسس کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے ایک پیچیدہ طریقہ پیدا کیا ہے. اگرچہ عمیق قوت کی تعلیم کھیل کے اگنٹ کی توسعہ میں اثبات دکھائی گئی ہے، کم نمونہ کے مطابق اور بڑے کام کی جگہ دو بڑے چالوں میں رہتے ہیں جو DRL کو حقیقی دنیا میں لازم کرنے سے روکتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم دنیا کی سمجھنے والی موڈیولوں کو معلوم کرنے کے ذریعہ چلنے والی چالوں سے استعمال کرتے ہیں، جو اپنے ساتھ کاموں کو ٹوٹ ڈال دیتے ہیں اور اقدامات کو محیط محیط کے بارے میں سوال جواب دیتے ہیں. اس کے بعد ہم ایک دومرحلہ تدریس فرم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ زبان کی تعلیم مضبوط تعلیم سے بٹا دیں، جو نمونہ کے مطابق اضافہ کرتا ہے. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ عملکرد اور نمونہ عملکرد کو اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، اس نے پیوند کی خطا اور محدودہ پیش آموزش دیٹوں کے مقابلہ میں سختی دکھائی ہے.', 'uz': "Matn asosida oʻyinlarName O'rganishni o'rganish o'rganishni o'ynashni o'rganishga yetarlicha ko'rsatadi, samol natijasida qo'shimcha effekti va katta amalning joyi bu ikkita muhim muammolar bo'lgan dunyoda DRL'ni qo'llashdan oldin. Bu qogʻozda, biz dunyoni ko'rsatish modullarni aniqlash orqali murakkablarini boshqaramiz. Bu muammolar haqida maslahatlarni javob berish orqali avtomatik o'zgartiradi. Keyin biz o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganish uchun ikkita darajada o'rganishni o'zgartiradik. Bu misol natijasini bajaradi. tajribalar natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, talab qilingan usulning natijasini va samol natijasini muhimiy oshirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, u birinchi taʼminlovchi xato haqida qo'shni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Trò chơi văn bản cung cấp một cách tương tác để học cách xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong khi việc học về cường độ sâu đã cho thấy hiệu quả trong việc phát triển trò chơi đặc vụ, tỉ lệ hiệu quả thấp và không gian hành động lớn vẫn còn là hai thử thách lớn cản trở đế DRL được áp dụng trong thế giới thực. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta giải quyết thử thách bằng cách tạo mô- đun cảm nhận thế giới, mà tự động phân hủy các việc làm và tỉa hành động bằng cách trả lời câu hỏi về môi trường. Chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ sở giáo dục hai giai đoạn tách rời học ngôn ngữ khỏi việc học tăng cường, nó sẽ cải thiện hiệu quả của mẫu. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp đã đề nghị cải thiện hiệu quả và hiệu quả của mẫu. Bên cạnh đó, nó hiển thị uy tín chống lỗi hợp và giới hạn dữ liệu trước khi huấn luyện.', 'nl': 'Tekstgebaseerde games bieden een interactieve manier om natuurlijke taalverwerking te bestuderen. Terwijl deep versterking learning effectiviteit heeft aangetoond bij de ontwikkeling van de game playing agent, blijven de lage sample efficiency en de grote actieruimte de twee grote uitdagingen die de DRL belemmeren om toegepast te worden in de echte wereld. In dit artikel gaan we de uitdagingen aan door het introduceren van wereldwaarnemende modules, die automatisch taken ontbinden en acties snoeien door vragen over het milieu te beantwoorden. Vervolgens stellen we een tweefasig trainingskader voor om taalleren los te koppelen van versterkend leren, wat de efficiëntie van de steekproef verder verbetert. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode de prestaties en de steekproefefficiëntie aanzienlijk verbetert. Bovendien toont het robuustheid tegen samengestelde fouten en beperkte pre-training data.', 'bg': 'Текстовите игри предоставят интерактивен начин за изучаване на обработката на естествения език. Докато дълбокото обучение за подсилване показа ефективност при разработването на игралния агент, ниската ефективност на извадката и голямото пространство за действие остават двете основни предизвикателства, които пречат на прилагането на ДРЛ в реалния свят. В тази статия се справяме с предизвикателствата чрез въвеждане на модули за възприемане на света, които автоматично разлагат задачите и подрязват действията, като отговарят на въпроси за околната среда. След това предлагаме двуфазна рамка за обучение, която да отдели езиковото обучение от засиленото обучение, което допълнително подобрява ефективността на извадката. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният метод значително подобрява производителността и ефективността на пробата. Освен това, той показва здравина срещу сложни грешки и ограничени данни преди тренировка.', 'da': 'Tekstbaserede spil giver en interaktiv måde at studere naturlig sprogbehandling på. Mens dyb forstærkning læring har vist effektivitet i udviklingen af spilleagenten, er den lave prøveeffektivitet og det store handlingsrum fortsat de to store udfordringer, der hindrer DRL i at blive anvendt i den virkelige verden. I denne artikel tager vi fat på udfordringerne ved at introducere verdensopfattende moduler, som automatisk nedbryder opgaver og beskærer handlinger ved at besvare spørgsmål om miljøet. Vi foreslår derefter en to-faset uddannelsesramme for at afkoble sprogindlæring fra styrkelse af indlæring, hvilket yderligere forbedrer stikprøvens effektivitet. De forsøgsresultater viser, at den foreslåede metode forbedrer ydeevnen og prøveeffektiviteten markant. Desuden viser det robusthed mod sammensatte fejl og begrænsede før træning data.', 'id': 'Permainan berdasarkan teks menyediakan cara interaktif untuk mempelajari proses bahasa alami. Sementara pembelajaran pendukung dalam menunjukkan efektivitas dalam mengembangkan agen permainan permainan, efektivitas sampel rendah dan ruang aksi besar tetap menjadi dua tantangan utama yang menghalangi DRL dari diterapkan di dunia nyata. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi tantangan dengan memperkenalkan modul yang menyaksikan dunia, yang secara otomatis menghancurkan tugas dan melakukan tindakan dengan menjawab pertanyaan tentang lingkungan. Kemudian kami mengusulkan dua fase cadangan pelatihan untuk memutuskan pembelajaran bahasa dari pembelajaran pemerintahan, yang lebih meningkatkan efisiensi sampel. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan meningkatkan prestasi dan efisiensi sampel secara signifikan. Selain itu, itu menunjukkan kekuatan terhadap kesalahan komponen dan data pre-pelatihan terbatas.', 'de': 'Textbasierte Spiele bieten eine interaktive Möglichkeit, natürliche Sprachverarbeitung zu studieren. Während Deep Enhancement Learning bei der Entwicklung des Spielagenten Effektivität gezeigt hat, bleiben die geringe Sampleeffizienz und der große Aktionsraum die beiden großen Herausforderungen, die die Anwendung der DRL in der realen Welt behindern. In diesem Beitrag gehen wir auf die Herausforderungen ein, indem wir weltwahrnehmende Module einführen, die Aufgaben automatisch zerlegen und Aktionen beschneiden, indem sie Fragen zur Umwelt beantworten. Anschließend schlagen wir einen zweiphasigen Trainingsrahmen vor, um Sprachenlernen vom Verstärkungslernen zu entkoppeln, was die Stichprobeneffizienz weiter verbessert. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode die Leistung und die Probeneffizienz signifikant verbessert. Außerdem zeigt es Robustheit gegenüber Compound-Fehlern und begrenzten Vortrainingsdaten.', 'hr': 'Igre na tekstu pružaju interaktivan način za proučavanje prirodnog obrade jezika. Iako je učenje dubokog pojačanja pokazalo učinkovitost u razvoju igračkog agenta, niska učinkovitost uzoraka i veliki prostor akcije ostala dva velika izazova koji sprječavaju da se DRL primjenjuje u stvarnom svijetu. U ovom papiru rješavamo izazove uvođenjem svijetskih modula koji automatski raspoređuju zadatke i pružaju akcije odgovarajući na pitanja o okruženju. Zatim predlažemo okvir za obuku na dvije faze kako bi se razdvojili učenje jezika iz učenja pojačanja, što „dodatno poboljšava učinkovitost uzoraka“. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda značajno poboljšava učinkovitost izvođenja i uzoraka. Osim toga, pokazuje snagu protiv povezanih grešaka i ograničenih podataka o predobuci.', 'ko': '텍스트 기반의 게임은 자연 언어 처리를 연구하는 상호작용적인 방법을 제공했다.딥 강화 학습은 게임 에이전트 개발에 유효성을 보였지만, 낮은 샘플 효율과 큰 액션 공간은 여전히 DRL이 현실 세계에서 적용되는 데 걸림돌이 되는 양대 도전이다.본고에서 우리는 세계 감지 모듈을 도입하여 이러한 도전에 대응하고 이 모듈은 환경과 관련된 질문에 대답함으로써 임무를 자동으로 분해하고 삭제 조작을 한다.그 다음에 우리는 두 단계의 훈련 구조를 제시하여 언어 학습과 학습의 결합을 강화하고 견본 효율을 한층 높였다.실험 결과에 따르면 이 방법은 성능과 샘플링 효율을 현저히 향상시켰다.그 밖에 복합 오차와 유한한 예비 훈련 데이터에 대해 노봉성을 가지고 있다.', 'sw': 'michezo yenye msingi wa maandishi yanatoa njia ya kujifunza upasuaji wa lugha asili. Wakati kujifunza kwa kina umeonyesha ufanisi wa kutengeneza ajenda ya mchezo, ufanisi wa sampuli duni na nafasi kubwa ya hatua bado unabaki kuwa changamoto mbili kubwa zinazozuia DRL kutokea kutumika katika dunia halisi. In this paper, we address the challenges by introducing world-perceiving modules, which automatically decompose tasks and prune actions by answering questions about the environment.  Kisha tunapendekeza mfumo wa mafunzo kwa hatua mbili ili kupunguza kujifunza lugha kutoka kwa kujifunza, ambao unaongeza ufanisi wa sampuli. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa inaboresha ufanisi na ufanisi wa sampuli. Zaidi yake, inaonyesha ubakaji dhidi ya makosa ya pamoja na taarifa za mafunzo ya kabla.', 'fa': 'بازی\u200cهای بنیاد متن راهی interactive برای تحقیق پردازش زبان طبیعی می\u200cدهند. در حالی که یادگیری پشتیبانی عمیق در توسعه مامور بازی را نشان داده است، فعالیت نمونه\u200cهای پایین و فضای فعالیت بزرگ دو چالش بزرگی هستند که جلوگیری از کاربرد DRL در دنیا واقعی می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما با توجه به مدول های متوجه شدن جهان، چالش\u200cها را با توجه به مشاهده می\u200cکنیم، که به طور خودکار کار\u200cها و عمل\u200cهایی را با پاسخ از سوالات درباره محیط محیط تغییر می\u200cدهند. سپس ما یک چراغ آموزش دو مرحله را پیشنهاد می کنیم تا یادگیری زبان را از یادگیری افزایش، که بیشتر فعالیت نمونه را بهتر می کند. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که روش پیشنهاد عملکرد و عملکرد نمونه را بسیار بهتر می کند. علاوه بر این، آن بر خلاف خطای ترکیب و داده های پیش آموزش محدود است.', 'sq': 'Lojrat me bazë teksti ofrojnë një mënyrë interaktive për të studiuar procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Ndërsa mësimi i thellë i forcimit ka treguar efektshmëri në zhvillimin e agjentit të lojës së lojës, efektshmëria e ulët e mostrave dhe hapësira e madhe e veprimit mbeten dy sfidat kryesore që pengojnë DRL nga zbatimi në botën reale. Në këtë letër, ne i trajtojmë sfidat duke paraqitur module që kuptojnë botën, që automatikisht shkatërrojnë detyrat dhe shkurtojnë veprimet duke përgjigjur pyetjeve rreth mjedisit. Pastaj propozojmë një kuadër treinimi dy-fazor për të shkëputur mësimin e gjuhës nga forcimi i mësimit, i cili përmirëson më tej efektshmërinë e mostrave. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar përmirëson ndjeshëm performancën dhe efektshmërinë e mostrave. Përveç kësaj, ajo tregon forcë kundër gabimeve të përziera dhe të dhënave të kufizuara të paratrajnimit.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ጨዋታ የጨዋታውን ጨዋታ ማግኘት የጨዋታውን አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና ትልቁ ትልቁ የሥርዓት ጥያቄ መሆኑን እና DRL በመጀመሪያው ዓለም እንዳይጠቀም የሚከለክሉ ሁለት ትልቁ ጥያቄዎች ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የዓለማዊ ማወቂያ ሞኮሎችን በመግለጽ እናስቃወማለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የሁለት ደረጃዎች ትምህርት ማግኘትን ለመጨመር የቋንቋን ትምህርት መፍታትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የፈተናው ውጤቶች የሞከረው ሥርዓት ፍቃዱን እና የምሳሌ ፍቃዱን በኩል ያሳርፋል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የጥብቅ ስህተት እና የቀድሞው ተማሪ ዳታ ላይ የሚቆጥረዋል፡፡', 'tr': 'Metin tabanly oýunlar tebigy dil işlemegini öwrenmek üçin etkileşimli ýoly temin edýär. Oýun oýunçysyny öwrenmek üçin ýokarylyk ýokarynda täsirleşmeligini görkezilýär, oýun oýunçysynyň täsirleşmeligini we uly hereket etmäge mejbur hereket eden iki esasy kynçylyk bolup durýar. Bu kagyzda, dünýäde göz ýetiren modülleri tanyşdyryp kynçylyklary çözýäris. Bu meseleleri çevre barada soraglary jogap berýän we öz-özüne çykarýar. Sonra diňe dil öwrenmesini güçlendirmekden çykarmak üçin 2-fäsi eğitim çerçevesini teklip edýäris. Bu nusgalaryň etkinliýetini daşyrýar. Deneysel netijeler teklip eden yöntemiň etkinlik we örnekleriniň tösümliliklerini has gowurarak çykýandygyny görkezýär. Munuň ýagdaýynda birleşen hatalaryň garşynda gaty güýçli we çarpyş öňünden öňünden eğitim maglumatyny görkezýär.', 'hy': "Տեքստի հիմնված խաղերը տրամադրում են ինտերակտիվ միջոց բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ ուսումնասիրելու համար: Մինչդեռ խորը ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրությունը ցույց է տալիս արդյունավետությունը խաղի խաղի գործակալի զարգացման մեջ, նմուշների ցածր արդյունավետությունը և մեծ գործողության տարածքը դեռևս երկու մեծ մարտահրավերն են, որոնք խոչընդոտում են Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք մարտահրավերները ներկայացնելով աշխարհի ընկալում մոդուլներ, որոնք ինքնաբերաբար բաժանում են առաջադրանքները և լուծում են գործողությունները' պատասխանելով շրջակա միջավայրի մասին հարցերին: Այնուհետև մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու փուլում ուսուցման շրջանակ լեզվի ուսումնասիրությունը բաժանելու համար, որը ավելի շատ բարելավում է նմուշների արդյունավետությունը: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը նշանակալի բարելավում է արդյունավետությունը և նմուշների արդյունավետությունը: Ավելին, այն ցույց է տալիս բարդ սխալների և սահմանափակ նախապատրաստ տվյալների դիմաց:", 'bn': 'টেক্সট ভিত্তিক খেলাগুলো প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া পড়ার জন্য একটি ইন্টারনেকটিভ উপায় প্রদান করে। যদিও গভীর শক্তিশালী শিক্ষা খেলা এজেন্টের উন্নয়নের কার্যক্রম দেখিয়েছে, কিন্তু কম নমুনা কার্যক্রম এবং বিশাল কাজের স্থান হচ্ছে দুটি প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিশ্বের প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়ে চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলি, যা পরিবেশ সম্পর্কে প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়ে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কাজ এবং কাজের তারপর আমরা দুই পর্যায়ের প্রশিক্ষণ কার্যক্রমের প্রস্তাব করি যাতে ভাষা শিক্ষা বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করা যায়, যা নমুনা কার্যক্রম আরো উন্নত করে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাবে প্রদর্শন এবং নমুনালের কার্যক্রম উন্নত করে। তাছাড়াও, এটা প্রথম প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যের বিরুদ্ধে রাস্তা প্রদর্শন করে।', 'az': "Metin tabanlı oyunları təbii dil işləməsini öyrənmək üçün interaktif bir yol təmin edir. Oyun oyun aģentəsini inkişaf etmək üçün çox güclü öyrənmək tərzini göstərdiyi halda, düşük nümunə tərzini və böyük eyni alan həqiqət dünyada DRL'i istifadə etməyə mane edən iki böyük çətinliklərdir. Bu kağızda, dünya görünür modullarını təşkil etmək üçün çətinliklərə çəkirik ki, işləri öz-özünə parçalayır və təşkil etmək üçün çevre haqqında soruşanlara cavab verir. Sonra da dil öyrənməsini artırmaq öyrənməkdən ayırmaq üçün iki fərz təhsil çerçivesini təklif edirik ki, örnək faydalanılığını daha da artırar. Müxtəlif sonuçlar təbliğ edilmiş metodların performans və nümunələrin faydallığını çox yaxşılaşdırır. Bundan başqa, o, birləşdirilmiş xətaların və təhsil edilmə məlumatlarının əleyhinə sərtlik göstərir.", 'ca': "Els jocs basats en text proporcionen una manera interactiva d'estudiar el processament natural de llenguatges. Mentre que l'aprenentatge de reforç profund ha demostrat eficacia en desenvolupar l'agent de joc, la baixa eficiència de la mostra i l'espai d'acció gran encara són els dos principals reptes que impedeixen que la LDR s'apliqui al món real. En aquest paper, ens ocupem dels reptes introduint móduls de percepció mundial, que descomponen automàticament tasques i accions de pruna responent a preguntes sobre l'entorn. Després proposem un marc de formació en dos fases per descoplar l'aprenentatge de llenguatges de l'aprenentatge de reforç, que millora encara més l'eficiència de la mostra. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el mètode proposat millora significativament el rendiment i l'eficiència de la mostra. A més, mostra robustetat contra els errors complexos i dades limitades de pré-entrenament.", 'bs': 'Igre na tekstu pružaju interaktivan način za proučavanje prirodnog obrade jezika. Iako je učenje dubokog pojačanja pokazalo učinkovitost u razvoju igračkog agenta, niska učinkovitost uzorka i veliki prostor akcije ostala dva velika izazova koji sprječavaju da se DRL primjenjuje u stvarnom svijetu. U ovom papiru rješavamo izazove uvođenjem svijetskih modula koji automatski raspoređuju zadatke i pružaju akcije odgovarajući na pitanja o okruženju. Onda predlažemo okvir za obuku na dvofazi da se rasključi učenje jezika iz učenja pojačanja, što „bolje poboljšava učinkovitost uzoraka“. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda značajno poboljšava učinkovitost izvođenja i uzoraka. Osim toga, pokazuje snagu protiv povezanih grešaka i ograničenih podataka o predobuci.', 'et': 'Tekstipõhised mängud pakuvad interaktiivset võimalust õppida loodusliku keele töötlemist. Kuigi sügav tugevdamine on näidanud tõhusust mängu mängimise agendi arendamisel, on madal valimi tõhusus ja suur tegevusruum endiselt kaks peamist väljakutset, mis takistavad DRLi rakendamist reaalses maailmas. Käesolevas dokumendis käsitleme väljakutseid, tutvustades maailma tajuvaid mooduleid, mis automaatselt lagundavad ülesanded ja kärivad tegevusi, vastates keskkonnaküsimustele. Seejärel teeme ettepaneku luua kaheetapiline koolitusraamistik keeleõppe lahutamiseks tugevdatud õppest, mis parandab veelgi valimi tõhusust. Katsetulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod parandab oluliselt tulemuslikkust ja proovi efektiivsust. Pealegi näitab see tugevust liitvigade ja piiratud koolituseelsete andmete vastu.', 'cs': 'Textové hry poskytují interaktivní způsob, jak studovat zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Zatímco hluboké posilování učení ukázalo účinnost při vývoji herního prostředku, nízká efektivita vzorků a velký akční prostor zůstávají dvěma hlavními výzvami, které brání použití DRL v reálném světě. V tomto článku řešíme výzvy představením modulů vnímání světa, které automaticky rozkládají úkoly a snižují akce odpovědí na otázky týkající se životního prostředí. Následně navrhujeme dvoufázový vzdělávací rámec pro oddělení výuky jazyků od posilovacího učení, což dále zlepšuje efektivitu vzorků. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda výrazně zlepšuje výkon a efektivitu vzorku. Kromě toho vykazuje robustnost proti komplikovaným chybám a omezeným předtréninkovým datům.', 'fi': 'Tekstipohjaiset pelit tarjoavat interaktiivisen tavan opiskella luonnollisen kielen käsittelyä. Vaikka syvän vahvistuksen oppiminen on osoittanut tehokkuutta pelivälineen kehittämisessä, pieni näytetehokkuus ja suuri toimintatila ovat edelleen kaksi suurta haastetta, jotka estävät DRL:n soveltamista reaalimaailmassa. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme haasteita ottamalla käyttöön maailmaa havainnoivia moduuleja, jotka automaattisesti hajottavat tehtäviä ja karsivat toimia vastaamalla ympäristöön liittyviin kysymyksiin. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme kaksivaiheista koulutuskehystä kieltenoppimisen ja tehostetun oppimisen erottamiseksi toisistaan, mikä parantaa otoksen tehokkuutta entisestään. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä parantaa merkittävästi suorituskykyä ja näytteen tehokkuutta. Lisäksi se osoittaa kestävyyttä komposiittivirheitä vastaan ja rajallista esikoulutusta koskevaa tietoa vastaan.', 'af': "Teksbaseerde speletjies verskaf 'n interaktief manier om natuurlike taal verwerking te studeer. Alhoewel diep versterking leer effektief in die ontwikkeling van die speletjie speletjie agent vertoon het, die lae voorbeeld effektief en die groot aksie ruimte bly om die twee groot uitdagings te wees wat hinder die DRL van toepassing in die reël wêreld te word. In hierdie papier, word ons die uitdagings aangespreek deur die voorbeeld van die wêreld-ontvangende modules te introduseer, wat outomaties opdragte en aksies verdruk deur vrae oor die omgewing te antwoord. Ons voorstel dan 'n twee-fase onderwerking raamwerk om taal leer te ontkoppel van versterking leer, wat ’n verderer verbeter die voorbeeld effektiviteit. Die eksperimentale resultate wys dat die voorgestelde metode betekeurig die prestasie en voorbeeld effektiviteit verbeter. In buite van, vertoon dit kragtigheid teen samenskaplike fout en beperk voor-oefening data.", 'sk': 'Besedilne igre zagotavljajo interaktiven način za študij obdelave naravnega jezika. Medtem ko je globoko učenje za okrepitev pokazalo učinkovitost pri razvoju igralnega sredstva, sta nizka učinkovitost vzorca in velik akcijski prostor še vedno dva glavna izziva, ki ovirata uporabo DRL v realnem svetu. V prispevku obravnavamo izzive z uvedbo modulov za zaznavanje sveta, ki samodejno razgradijo naloge in obrezujejo dejanja z odgovori na vprašanja o okolju. Nato predlagamo dvofazni okvir usposabljanja za ločitev učenja jezikov od okrepitvenega učenja, kar dodatno izboljšuje učinkovitost vzorca. Rezultati poskusov kažejo, da predlagana metoda bistveno izboljša učinkovitost in učinkovitost vzorca. Poleg tega kaže robustnost pred sestavljenimi napakami in omejenimi podatki pred treningom.', 'ha': "Game na masu bincike na matsayi na samar da wata hanya mai interactive zuwa karatun zartar da harshen asimi. A lokacin da ƙari na ƙari ya nuna mafiya amfani da kwamfyuta a danne mai gamuwa da gamuwa, sai mai sauri na samofali da filin aiki na ƙari ya zama masu muhimmi biyu na kanza DRL kada a yi amfani da shi a cikin duniya halinsa. Ga wannan takardan, Munã jãyayya masu cikin musamman da za'a introduce modulen da ke fahimta duniya, wanda ke karya aiki farat ɗaya kuma ke karya masu aiki da baka tambayar muhalli. Sa'an nan kuma Muke goyyar da wani firam na mafarin fasa biyu dõmin ya ƙara learning na harshe daga ƙaranci, wanda ya ƙara fikanci na sami. Matarin da aka jarraba yana nũna cewa metoden da aka buƙata, yana mai kyau ga fassarar da samofi. Bayan haka, yana nũna fitarwa kan ɓata mai haɗuwa da data masu tsarin gaba ɗaya.", 'he': 'משחקים מבוססים בטקסט מספקים דרך אינטראקטיבית ללמוד עיבוד שפה טבעי. למרות שלמדת תגבורת עמוקה הראה יעילות בפיתוח סוכן משחק המשחק, יעילות הדגימות הנמוכה והמקום הפעולה הגדול נשארו שני האתגרים הגדולים שמעכבים את DRL מלהתפקד בעולם האמיתי. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם האתגרים בכך שאנחנו מציגים מודולים של התפיסה העולמית, שמפרקים באופן אוטומטי את המשימות והפעולות על ידי לענות על שאלות על הסביבה. ואז אנו מציעים מסגרת אימון בשתי שלבים כדי לפרוק את לימוד שפות מלמדת חיבור, מה שממשיך לשפר את יעילות הדגימה. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שהשיטה המוצעת משפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה והיעילות של הדגימה. חוץ מזה, זה מראה חזקה נגד טעות מורכבת ומידע מוגבל לפני האימונים.', 'jv': 'Dolanan sing basa gambar tekan interactive deep Nang mapun iki, kita diwubah perbudhakan kanggo nyengkuyung modul sing gak perusahaan ning dunya Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem sing beraksi iki-iki banget kanggo nggawe gerakan luwih bantuan ingkang nggawe, sing uwis njaluk bantuan ingkang dianggap. Rejalaké sing paling nggambar barang kelas supoyo nggawe akeh njaluk nung akeh lanjut cara nggawe barang sampek. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་རྩེད་གཞུང་གིས་རང་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ཤིག་བྱིན་པ རྩེདམོ་གཏོང་གི་ནང་དུ་ཟབ་རྒྱས་གཏོང་སྐྱོང་བའི་སྐྱོན་རིམ་གྱིས་རྩེདམོ་གཏོང་ནང་ནུས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ངོ་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་ཉུང་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་བྱ་བ་ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་ལ་ཤེས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཚུ་སྤྲོད་ནས་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་དུ་འཇུག་རྟེན་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལས་འག འོན་ཀྱང་། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དག་དེ་ལ་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་གྲུབ་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དང་དཔེ་བརྗོད་སྟངས་ປະສ ན་རྐྱེ དེ་ལས་བརྟེན། སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བ་དང་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Knowledge Graph Completion and Question Answering', 'ar': 'البحث عن الملصق العصبي عن تلخيص استخلاصي متعدد اللغات بدون طلقة', 'pt': 'Pesquisa de rótulo neural para sumarização extrativa multilíngue Zero-Shot', 'es': 'Búsqueda de etiquetas neuronales para la sumarización extractiva multilingüe de tiro cero', 'fr': "Recherche d'étiquettes neuronales pour la synthèse extractive multilingue Zero-Shot", 'ja': 'ゼロショット多言語抽出要約のための神経ラベル検索', 'zh': '以零次多言取摘要神经标索之', 'hi': 'शून्य-शॉट बहुभाषी निष्कर्षण Summarization के लिए तंत्रिका लेबल खोज', 'ru': 'Поиск по нейронным меткам для многоязычного экстрактивного суммирования с нулевым снимком', 'ga': 'Lipéad Néarach Cuardach le haghaidh Achoimriú Eastóscach Ilteangach Zero-Shot', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neural Label Search for Zero-Shot többnyelvű extraktív összefoglaló', 'el': 'Νευρική Αναζήτηση ετικετών για μηδενική-πυροβολιστική πολυγλωσσική εκχυλιστική περίληψη', 'kk': 'Нейрондық жарлық Zero- Shot көп тілік тарқату тұжырымдамасын іздеу', 'lt': 'Neuralinio ženklo paieška nulinės nuotraukos daugiakalbės ekstraktyvios santraukos', 'it': 'Ricerca di etichette neurali per la sintesi estrattiva multi-linguistica Zero-Shot', 'mk': 'Name', 'mt': 'It-Tfittxija tat-Tikketta Newrali għal Sommarju Extrattiv Multilingwali Żero-Shot', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ- ഷോട്ടിന്റെ അധികം ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനായി നെയുറല്\u200d ലേബെല്\u200d തെരച്ചില്\u200dQuery', 'mn': 'Нэг-Shot олон хэлбэрийн нэмэгдүүлэлтийг хайх мэдрэлийн найз', 'pl': 'Wyszukiwanie etykiet neuronowych dla zerowych wielojęzycznych ekstrakcyjnych streszczeń ekstrakcyjnych', 'no': 'Nøyraletikett Søk etter null- Shot multi- Lingual Extractive Summarization', 'ro': 'Căutare de etichete neurale pentru rezumarea extractivă multilingvistică Zero-Shot', 'sr': 'Neuralna etiketa traži višestruki ekstraktivni sažetak za nulo-pucanje', 'si': 'සීරෝ- විස්තාරයක් ගොඩක් ලින්ගුවල් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සුරක්ෂණය සඳහා හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Qoriga naadiga raadinta Zero-Shot Summariisation', 'sv': 'Neural Label Sök efter Zero-Shot flerspråkig extraktionssammanfattning', 'ta': 'சூட்- ஷாட் பல- Lingual Extract சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'نیورال لابل صفر-شٹ Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarization کے لئے تلاش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tìm nhãn thần kinh cho các loại đa nhiễm trùng', 'da': 'Neural Label Search for Zero-Shot Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarisation', 'hr': 'Neuralna etiketa potraži višeLingualnu ekstraktivnu sažetku', 'bg': 'Търсене на неврални етикети за многолингвистично обобщаване на нулеви снимки', 'nl': 'Neural Label Search for Zero-Shot Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarization', 'de': 'Neural Label Search for Zero-Shot Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarisation', 'id': 'Label Neural Search for Zero-Shot Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarization', 'ko': '신경 라벨 검색 기반 제로 포 다중 언어 추출 요약', 'fa': 'برچسب عصبی جستجو جستجو مجدد زبان\u200cهای خارج\u200cکننده صفر', 'sw': 'Tafuta alama ya kisasa kwa ajili ya Ujumbe wa Kilingi', 'tr': 'Näsaz etiket', 'sq': 'Kërkimi i Etiketës Neurale për Znj-Znj-Znj-Znj-Znj-Znj.', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'Search for Zero-Shot Multi-Lingual Extract Summary', 'az': 'Nöral etiketi Sıfır-Shot Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarization axtarır', 'bn': 'পূর্ণ- শুটের জন্য নিউরেল লেবেল অনুসন্ধান', 'bs': 'Neuralna etiketa traži višeLingualnu ekstraktivnu sažetku', 'ca': 'Neural Label Search for Zero-Shot Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarization', 'et': 'Nullshoti mitmekeelse ekstraktiivse kokkuvõtte neurosildi otsing', 'cs': 'Vyhledávání neuronových štítků pro Zero-Shot multilingvální extrakční shrnutí', 'fi': 'Zero-Shot monikielisen ekstraktiivisen yhteenvedon neurotunnisteen haku', 'jv': 'Label', 'sk': 'Iskanje nevralnih oznak za Zero-Shot večjezikovno ekstraktivno povzetek', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'Search for Zero- shot multiple- Linguil Extraction Summary', 'bo': 'Neural Label Search for Zero-Shot Multi-Lingual Extractive Summarization'}
{'en': 'Knowledge graph embedding (KGE) models represent each entity and relation of a knowledge graph (KG) with low-dimensional embedding vectors. These methods have recently been applied to KG link prediction and question answering over incomplete KGs (KGQA). KGEs typically create an embedding for each entity in the graph, which results in large model sizes on real-world graphs with millions of entities. For downstream tasks these atomic entity representations often need to be integrated into a multi stage pipeline, limiting their utility. We show that an off-the-shelf encoder-decoder Transformer model can serve as a scalable and versatile KGE model obtaining state-of-the-art results for KG link prediction and incomplete KG question answering. We achieve this by posing KG link prediction as a sequence-to-sequence task and exchange the triple scoring approach taken by prior KGE methods with autoregressive decoding. Such a simple but powerful method reduces the model size up to 98% compared to conventional KGE models while keeping inference time tractable. After finetuning this model on the task of KGQA over incomplete KGs, our approach outperforms baselines on multiple large-scale datasets without extensive hyperparameter tuning.', 'ar': 'في تلخيص النص الاستخراجي متعدد اللغات بدون طلقة ، يتم تدريب النموذج عادةً على مجموعة بيانات تلخيص اللغة الإنجليزية ثم يتم تطبيقه على مجموعات بيانات التلخيص للغات أخرى. بالنظر إلى المستندات والملخصات الذهبية الإنجليزية ، عادةً ما يتم إنشاء تسميات على مستوى الجملة للتلخيص الاستخراجي باستخدام الاستدلال. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه التسميات أحادية اللغة التي تم إنشاؤها على مجموعات البيانات الإنجليزية قد لا تكون مثالية في مجموعات البيانات الخاصة باللغات الأخرى ، لذلك يوجد تناقض نحوي أو دلالي بين اللغات المختلفة. بهذه الطريقة ، من الممكن ترجمة مجموعة البيانات الإنجليزية إلى لغات أخرى والحصول على مجموعات مختلفة من الملصقات مرة أخرى باستخدام الاستدلال. للاستفادة الكاملة من معلومات هذه المجموعات المختلفة من الملصقات ، نقترح NLSSum (البحث عن الملصقات العصبية للتلخيص) ، الذي يتعلم بشكل مشترك الأوزان الهرمية لهذه المجموعات المختلفة من الملصقات مع نموذج التلخيص الخاص بنا. نجري تجارب تلخيص متعددة اللغات على مجموعتي بيانات MLSUM و WikiLingua ، ونحقق أحدث النتائج باستخدام التقييمات البشرية والتلقائية عبر مجموعتي البيانات هاتين.', 'fr': "Dans la synthèse de texte extractive multilingue zero-shot, un modèle est généralement formé sur un jeu de données de synthèse en anglais, puis appliqué à des ensembles de données de synthèse d'autres langues. Étant donné les résumés et documents Gold en anglais, les étiquettes au niveau de la phrase pour la synthèse extractive sont généralement générées à l'aide d'heuristiques. Cependant, ces étiquettes monolingues créées sur des ensembles de données anglais peuvent ne pas être optimales sur des ensembles de données d'autres langues, car il existe une différence syntaxique ou sémantique entre les différentes langues. De cette façon, il est possible de traduire le jeu de données anglais dans d'autres langues et d'obtenir à nouveau différents ensembles d'étiquettes à l'aide d'heuristiques. Pour tirer pleinement parti des informations de ces différents ensembles d'étiquettes, nous proposons NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), qui apprend conjointement les pondérations hiérarchiques pour ces différents ensembles d'étiquettes avec notre modèle de synthèse. Nous menons des expériences de synthèse zero-shot multilingues sur des ensembles de données MLSUM et WikiLingua, et nous obtenons des résultats de pointe en utilisant à la fois des évaluations humaines et automatiques sur ces deux ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'Na sumarização de texto extrativo multilíngue zero-shot, um modelo normalmente é treinado no conjunto de dados de sumarização em inglês e, em seguida, aplicado em conjuntos de dados de sumarização de outros idiomas. Dados os resumos e documentos de ouro em inglês, os rótulos de nível de sentença para sumarização extrativa geralmente são gerados usando heurística. No entanto, esses rótulos monolíngues criados em conjuntos de dados em inglês podem não ser ideais em conjuntos de outros idiomas, para isso há a discrepância sintática ou semântica entre os diferentes idiomas. Dessa forma, é possível traduzir o conjunto de dados em inglês para outros idiomas e obter novamente conjuntos de rótulos diferentes usando heurísticas. Para aproveitar totalmente as informações desses diferentes conjuntos de rótulos, propomos o NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), que aprende conjuntamente pesos hierárquicos para esses diferentes conjuntos de rótulos junto com nosso modelo de sumarização. Conduzimos experimentos multilíngues de sumarização zero-shot em conjuntos de dados MLSUM e WikiLingua e alcançamos resultados de última geração usando avaliações humanas e automáticas nesses dois conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'En la sumarización extractiva multilingüe de texto cero, un modelo generalmente se entrena en un conjunto de datos de resumen en inglés y luego se aplica en conjuntos de datos de resumen de otros idiomas. Teniendo en cuenta los resúmenes y documentos dorados en inglés, las etiquetas de nivel de oración para el resumen extractivo generalmente se generan mediante heurística. Sin embargo, estas etiquetas monolingües creadas en conjuntos de datos en inglés pueden no ser óptimas en conjuntos de datos de otros idiomas, ya que existe una discrepancia sintáctica o semántica entre los diferentes idiomas. De esta manera, es posible traducir el conjunto de datos en inglés a otros idiomas y volver a obtener diferentes conjuntos de etiquetas mediante heurística. Para aprovechar al máximo la información de estos diferentes conjuntos de etiquetas, proponemos NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), que aprende conjuntamente los pesos jerárquicos para estos diferentes conjuntos de etiquetas junto con nuestro modelo de resumen. Llevamos a cabo experimentos multilingües de resumen cero en conjuntos de datos de MLSUM y WikiLingua, y logramos resultados de vanguardia utilizando evaluaciones humanas y automáticas en estos dos conjuntos de datos.', 'ja': 'ゼロショット多言語抽出テキストサマリゼーションでは、モデルは通常、英語のサマリゼーションデータセットでトレーニングされ、その後他の言語のサマリゼーションデータセットに適用されます。 英語の金の要約と文書を考えると、抽出要約の文章レベルのラベルは通常、ヒューリスティックを使用して生成されます。 ただし、英語のデータセットに作成されたこれらの単語ラベルは、異なる言語間の構文または意味の不一致があるため、他の言語のデータセットに最適ではない場合があります。 このようにして、英語のデータセットを他の言語に翻訳し、ヒューリスティックを使用して異なるラベルセットを再度取得することができます。 これらの異なるラベルセットの情報を十分に活用するために、私たちは要約モデルと共にこれらの異なるラベルセットの階層的重み付けを共同で学習するNLSSum （要約のためのニューラルラベル検索）を提案します。 MLSUMとWikiLinguaのデータセットで多言語のゼロショット要約実験を行い、これら2つのデータセットにわたる人間評価と自動評価の両方を使用して最先端の結果を達成します。', 'hi': 'शून्य-शॉट बहुभाषी निष्कर्षण पाठ सारांशीकरण में, एक मॉडल को आमतौर पर अंग्रेजी सारांश डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है और फिर अन्य भाषाओं के सारांश डेटासेट पर लागू किया जाता है। अंग्रेजी सोने के सारांश और दस्तावेजों को देखते हुए, निष्कर्षण summarization के लिए वाक्य-स्तर के लेबल आमतौर पर heuristics का उपयोग करके उत्पन्न होते हैं। हालांकि, अंग्रेजी डेटासेट पर बनाए गए ये मोनोलिंगुअल लेबल अन्य भाषाओं के डेटासेट पर इष्टतम नहीं हो सकते हैं, इसके लिए विभिन्न भाषाओं के बीच वाक्यात्मक या शब्दार्थ विसंगति है। इस तरह, अंग्रेजी डेटासेट को अन्य भाषाओं में अनुवाद करना और ह्यूरिस्टिक्स का उपयोग करके लेबल के विभिन्न सेट प्राप्त करना संभव है। लेबल के इन विभिन्न सेटों की जानकारी का पूरी तरह से लाभ उठाने के लिए, हम NLSSum (न्यूरल लेबल सर्च फॉर सारांशीकरण) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो संयुक्त रूप से हमारे सारांश मॉडल के साथ लेबल के इन विभिन्न सेटों के लिए पदानुक्रमित वजन सीखता है। हम MLSUM और WikiLingua डेटासेट पर बहुभाषी शून्य-शॉट सारांशीकरण प्रयोगों का संचालन करते हैं, और हम इन दो डेटासेट में मानव और स्वचालित मूल्यांकन दोनों का उपयोग करके अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'zh': '零次多言取文本摘要中,模常于英语摘要数集上训练,然后应用他语言摘要数集。 给定英文黄金摘要文档,取性摘要句级标常用启发式法成。 然于英语数集上创此单语标于他语之数集上或非佳者,盖言语之间有语法语义异也。 如此者,可将英语数集翻译成他语,并用启发式法再得标签集。 为此异者,NLSSum(神经而索摘要),与吾结模而共学之。 MLSUM、WikiLingua数集上多言零镜头结实验,而以其人工自料最先进也。', 'ru': 'При многоязычном экстрактивном обобщении текста с нулевым снимком модель обычно обучают набору данных для обобщения на английском языке, а затем применяют к наборам данных для обобщения на других языках. Учитывая английские золотые резюме и документы, метки на уровне предложений для экстрактивного обобщения обычно генерируются с использованием эвристики. Однако эти одноязычные метки, созданные на английских наборах данных, могут не быть оптимальными на наборах данных других языков, поскольку существует синтаксическое или семантическое расхождение между различными языками. Таким образом, можно перевести английский набор данных на другие языки и снова получить различные наборы меток с помощью эвристики. Чтобы в полной мере использовать информацию этих различных наборов меток, мы предлагаем NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), который совместно изучает иерархические веса для этих различных наборов меток вместе с нашей моделью суммирования. Мы проводим многоязычные эксперименты по суммированию нулевых снимков на наборах данных MLSUM и WikiLingua, и мы достигаем самых современных результатов, используя как человеческие, так и автоматические оценки для этих двух наборов данных.', 'ga': 'In achoimriú téacsanna eastóscacha ilteangacha nialasacha, déantar samhail a oiliúint go hiondúil ar thacar sonraí achoimre Béarla agus ansin cuirtear i bhfeidhm é ar thacair sonraí achoimrithe teangacha eile. I bhfianaise achoimrí agus doiciméid óir Bhéarla, is gnách go ngintear lipéid ar leibhéal na habairte le haghaidh achoimre eastóscach ag baint úsáide as heorastaíocht. Mar sin féin, b’fhéidir nach bhfuil na lipéid aonteangacha seo a chruthaítear ar thacair thacair Bhéarla optamach ar thacair thacair de theangacha eile, mar go bhfuil neamhréireacht chomhréire nó shéimeantach idir teangacha éagsúla. Ar an mbealach seo, is féidir an tacar sonraí Béarla a aistriú go teangacha eile agus tacair éagsúla lipéid a fháil arís ag baint úsáide as heuristics. Chun faisnéis na tacair éagsúla lipéad seo a ghiaráil go hiomlán, molaimid NLSSum (Cuardach Lipéad Neural le haghaidh Achoimre), a fhoghlaimíonn i gcomhpháirt meáchain ordlathacha do na tacair éagsúla lipéad seo mar aon lenár múnla achoimre. Déanaimid turgnaimh ilteangacha achoimrithe gan urchar ar thacair sonraí MLSUM agus WikiLingua, agus bainimid torthaí den scoth amach ag baint úsáide as meastóireachtaí daonna agus uathoibríocha ar fud an dá thacar sonraí seo.', 'el': 'Στην πολυγλωσσική ανασκόπηση κειμένου μηδενικού πυροβολισμού, ένα μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται συνήθως στο σύνολο δεδομένων σύνοψης στα αγγλικά και στη συνέχεια εφαρμόζεται σε σύνολα δεδομένων σύνοψης άλλων γλωσσών. Με βάση τις ελληνικές χρυσές περιλήψεις και τα έγγραφα, οι ετικέτες σε επίπεδο προτάσεων για την εκχυλιστική σύνοψη συνήθως δημιουργούνται με τη χρήση ευριστικών στοιχείων. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι μονογλωσσικές ετικέτες που δημιουργούνται σε αγγλικά σύνολα δεδομένων ενδέχεται να μην είναι βέλτιστες σε σύνολα δεδομένων άλλων γλωσσών, επειδή υπάρχει η συντακτική ή σημασιολογική διαφορά μεταξύ διαφορετικών γλωσσών. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, είναι δυνατή η μετάφραση του συνόλου δεδομένων των Αγγλικών σε άλλες γλώσσες και η απόκτηση διαφορετικών συνόλων ετικετών εκ νέου χρησιμοποιώντας heuristics. Για να αξιοποιήσουμε πλήρως τις πληροφορίες αυτών των διαφορετικών συνόλων ετικετών, προτείνουμε το το οποίο μαθαίνει από κοινού ιεραρχικά βάρη για αυτά τα διαφορετικά σύνολα ετικετών μαζί με το μοντέλο σύνοψής μας. Διεξάγουμε πολύγλωσσα πειράματα σύνοψης μηδενικών πυροβολισμών σε σύνολα δεδομένων και επιτυγχάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας χρησιμοποιώντας τόσο ανθρώπινες όσο και αυτόματες αξιολογήσεις σε αυτά τα δύο σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'A nulla-shot többnyelvű extraktív szöveg összefoglalása során a modellt általában angol összefoglaló adatkészletre képezik, majd más nyelvek összefoglaló adatkészleteire alkalmazzák. Az angol arany összefoglalók és dokumentumok alapján az extraktív összefoglaláshoz szükséges mondatszintű címkék általában heurisztikával készülnek. Azonban az angol adatkészleteken létrehozott egynyelvű címkék nem optimálisak más nyelvek adatkészleteire, mivel a különböző nyelvek közötti szintaktikai vagy szemantikai eltérés van. Így lehetséges lefordítani az angol adatkészletet más nyelvekre, és újra különböző címkéket szerezni heurisztikával. A különböző címkék információinak teljes mértékű kihasználása érdekében javasoljuk az NLSsum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), amely közösen megtanulja ezeknek a különböző címkéknek a hierarchikus súlyát az összefoglaló modellünkkel együtt. Többnyelvű nulla-shot összefoglaló kísérleteket végzünk MLSUM és WikiLingua adatkészleteken, és a legkorszerűbb eredményeket érünk el mind emberi, mind automatikus értékelésekkel ezen adatkészleten.', 'ka': '0- სურათის მრავალენგური ექსტრაქტიური ტექსტის სურაზიზაციაში, ანგლისური კურაზიზაციის მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის მონაცემების შესახებ მომხმარება და ანგლისური ცხოვრება და დოკუმენტების შესახებ, ექსტრაქტიური კუმენტიფიკაციის მიზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზეზები საუკეთე მაგრამ ეს მონოლენგური ნიშანები, რომლებიც ანგლისური დეტატური კონფიგურაციაში შექმნა, შეიძლება სხვა ენების დეტატური კონფიგურაციაში არ იყოს, რადგან სხვა ენების შორის ასე შეიძლება ინგლისური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას სხვა ენაში გადაწყენოთ და განსხვავებული etiket კონფიგურაციების კონფიგურაციას გამოყენებთ. ამ განსხვავებული ლაბეტების ინფორმაციის შესახებ, ჩვენ NLSSum (ნეიროლური ლაბეტების ძებნა კომპანიზაციაზე), რომელიც ერთადერთად ვისწავლის იერაქტიკური მნიშვნელობები ამ განსხვავებული ლაბეტების კომპანიზაცი ჩვენ მრავალენგური ნულ სურათის კოსუმენტიზაციის ექსპერიმენტები MLSUM და WikiLingua მონაცემების კოსტებში გავაკეთებთ, და ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ სამყარო წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა, რომელი', 'it': "Nella sintesi di testo estrattivo multilingue zero-shot, un modello viene tipicamente addestrato sul set di dati di sintesi inglese e poi applicato su set di dati di sintesi di altre lingue. Dati i riassunti e i documenti in oro inglese, le etichette a livello di frase per la sintesi estrattiva sono solitamente generate utilizzando euristica. Tuttavia, queste etichette monolingue create su set di dati inglesi potrebbero non essere ottimali su set di dati di altre lingue, poiché vi è la discrepanza sintattica o semantica tra lingue diverse. In questo modo, è possibile tradurre il dataset inglese in altre lingue e ottenere di nuovo insiemi diversi di etichette utilizzando l'euristica. Per sfruttare appieno le informazioni di questi diversi insiemi di etichette, proponiamo NLSsum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), che impara congiuntamente i pesi gerarchici per questi diversi insiemi di etichette insieme al nostro modello di sintesi. Conduciamo esperimenti multilingue di sintesi zero-shot su set di dati MLSUM e WikiLingua e otteniamo risultati all'avanguardia utilizzando valutazioni umane e automatiche su questi due set di dati.", 'kk': 'Нөл түрінде көптілік тарқату мәтінді жинақтау үшін, әдетте ағылшын тілдерінің жинақтау деректер жинағында оқылған үлгі және басқа тілдер жинақтау деректер жинағында қолданылады. Ағылшын тілінде алтын тұжырымдары мен құжаттарды көрсету үшін сұлбаның деңгейі жарлықтары кәдімгі геуристикалық көмегімен құрылады. Бірақ ағылшын деректер қорларында құрылған монолингі жарлықтар басқа тілдер деректер қорларында оптимал болмауы мүмкін, себебі бұл тілдер арасындағы синтактикалық не семантикалық бөлігі бар. Бұл түрде ағылшын деректер қорларын басқа тілдерге аударып, геуристиканы қолдану арқылы түрлі жарлықтар жиынын қайталау мүмкін. Бұл әртүрлі жарлықтардың мәліметін толық түрлендіру үшін, NLSSum (Нейралық жарлықтар тізімін іздеу үшін) жұмыс істейміз. Бұл әртүрлі жарлықтардың иерархиялық тегін біріктіру үлгісімен бірге бірге үй Біз MLSUM және WikiLingua деректер қорларында көптеген тілдерді нөл түрлі түрлендіру тәжірибелерін жұмыс істейміз. Бұл екі деректер қорларында адам және автоматты түрлендіру нәтижелерін қолданатын.', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbio teksto santraukoje, kuria apibūdinamas nulinis nuotraukas, model is paprastai mokomas anglų santraukos duomenų rinkinyje ir vėliau taikomas kitų kalbų santraukų duomenų rinkiniuose. Atsižvelgiant į anglų aukso santraukas ir dokumentus, frazių lygio etiketės ekstraktyviai santraukai paprastai generuojamos naudojant heuristiką. Tačiau šios vienakalbės etiketės, sukurtos anglų duomenų rinkiniuose, negali būti optimalios kitų kalbų duomenų rinkiniuose, nes yra sintaktinis arba semantinis skirtingų kalbų skirtumas. Taip galima verti anglų duomenų rinkinį į kitas kalbas ir vėl gauti skirtingus etikečių rinkinius naudojant heuristiką. Siekiant visiškai panaudoti šių skirtingų etikečių rinkinių informaciją, siūlome NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summary), kuris kartu mokosi hierarchinių svorių šiems skirtingiems etikečių rinkiniams kartu su mūsų santraukos modeliu. Atliekame daugiakalbius nulinės nuotraukos apibendrinimo eksperimentus su MLSUM ir WikiLingua duomenų rinkiniais ir pasiekiame naujausius rezultatus naudojant ir žmogiškuosius, ir automatinius šių dviejų duomenų rinkinių vertinimus.', 'mk': 'Во нулјазичната мултијазичка екстрактивна резултатација на текстот, моделот обично се обучува на англискиот набор на податоци за резултати и потоа се применува на наборот на податоци за резултати на другите јазици. Со оглед на англиските златни резултати и документи, етикетите на ниво на реченици за екстрактивна резултатација обично се генерираат со користење хеористика. Сепак, овие монојазични етикети создадени на англиските податоци можеби не се оптимални на податоците на други јазици, бидејќи постои синтактичка или семантична дискрепанција помеѓу различните јазици. На овој начин е можно да се преведат англиските податоци на други јазици и да се добијат различни набори на етикети повторно користејќи хеористика. To fully leverage the information of these different sets of labels, we propose NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), which jointly learns hierarchical weights for these different sets of labels together with our summarization model.  Правиме мултијазички експерименти за резултат со нула снимка на MLSUM и WikiLingua datasets, и постигнуваме најсовремени резултати користејќи и човечки, и автоматски проценки низ овие два datasets.', 'ms': 'Dalam ringkasan teks ekstraktif berbilang bahasa-sifar, model biasanya dilatih pada set data ringkasan Inggeris dan kemudian dilaksanakan pada set data ringkasan bahasa lain. Menurut ringkasan emas dan dokumen Inggeris, label aras kalimat untuk ringkasan ekstraktif biasanya dijana menggunakan heuristik. Namun, label monobahasa ini dicipta pada set data Inggeris mungkin tidak optimal pada set data bahasa lain, kerana terdapat ketidaksamaan sintaktik atau semantik antara bahasa yang berbeza. Dengan cara ini, ia adalah mungkin untuk menerjemahkan set data Inggeris ke bahasa lain dan mendapatkan set label berbeza lagi menggunakan heuristik. Untuk mengambil keseluruhan maklumat set label yang berbeza ini, kami cadangkan NLSSum (Carian Label Neural untuk Ringkasan), yang bersama-sama belajar berat hierarkis bagi set label yang berbeza ini bersama-sama dengan model ringkasan kami. Kami melakukan eksperimen ringkasan sifar berbilang bahasa pada set data MLSUM dan WikiLingua, dan kami mencapai keputusan state-of-the-art menggunakan kedua-dua penilaian manusia dan automatik di antara kedua-dua set data ini.', 'mt': 'F’sommarju tat-test estrattiv multilingwi b’ritratt żero, mudell tipikament jitħarreġ fuq sett ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju Ingliż u mbagħad jiġi applikat fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju ta’ lingwi oħra. Minħabba sommarji u dokumenti tad-deheb Ingliż, it-tikketti fil-livell tas-sentenzi għas-sommarju estrattiv normalment jiġu ġġenerati bl-użu tal-ġewristiċi. Madankollu, dawn it-tikketti monolingwi maħluqa fuq settijiet ta’ dejta Ingliżi jistgħu ma jkunux ottimali fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ lingwi oħra, għaliex hemm diskrepanza sintattika jew semantika bejn lingwi differenti. B’dan il-mod, huwa possibbli li s-sett tad-dejta Ingliż jiġi tradott għal lingwi oħra u li jerġa’ jinkisbu settijiet differenti ta’ tikketti bl-użu tal-ġewristiċi. Biex ninfurzaw bis-sħiħ l-informazzjoni ta’ dawn is-settijiet differenti ta’ tikketti, qed nipproponu NLSSum (Tfittxija Newrali tat-Tikketta għas-Sommarju), li flimkien jitgħallmu piżijiet ġerarkiċi għal dawn is-settijiet differenti ta’ tikketti flimkien mal-mudell tagħna ta’ sommarju. Aħna nieħdu esperimenti multilingwi ta’ sommarju mingħajr skop fuq settijiet ta’ dejta MLSUM u WikiLingua, u niksbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati bl-użu kemm ta’ evalwazzjonijiet umani kif ukoll awtomatiċi f’dawn iż-żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta.', 'mn': 'Нэг хэл дээр олон хэлний нэмэгдүүлэх текст дурангууд дээр загвар Англи хэлний дурангуудын өгөгдлийн санд сургалтын тулд, дараа нь бусад хэлний дурангуудын өгөгдлийн санд хэрэглэгддэг. Англи хэлний алтын нийлүүлэлт болон баримтууд учраас, нэмэлт нийлүүлэлтийн үеийн нийлүүлэлт нь ихэвчлэн геуристик ашиглан бий болдог. Гэхдээ Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн сан дээр бий болсон эдгээр ганц хэлний etiketүүд бусад хэлний өгөгдлийн санд сайн сайн байж болохгүй, учир нь өөр хэлний хооронд синтактик эсвэл semantic ялгаа байдаг. Иймээс Англи өгөгдлийн санг бусад хэлүүд рүү орлуулж, геуристик ашиглан өөр хэлбэрүүдийг олох боломжтой. Эдгээр өөр жагсаалтын мэдээллийг бүрэн ашиглахын тулд бид NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization) гэсэн санал болгож байна. Энэ нь нийлбэл эдгээр өөр жагсаалтын жинтэй хэмжээсүүдийг бидний жинтэй загвартай хамтдаа суралцдаг. Бид MLSUM болон WikiLingua өгөгдлийн сангийн олон хэлний зураг цэгцэглэх туршилтыг хийдэг. Бид эдгээр хоёр өгөгдлийн сангийн хооронд хүн болон автоматжуулсан оюутнуудыг ашиглан урлагийн үндсэн үр дүн гаргадаг.', 'ml': 'പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി വെടിവെക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ചുരുക്കത്തിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസറേഷനില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പിന്നെ മറ്റു ഭാഷ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്വര്\u200dണ്ണവും രേഖകളും കൊടുത്താല്\u200d, എക്സ്റ്റെക്റ്റീവ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്ക് നില ല ലേബല എങ്കിലും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഈ മോനോളില്\u200d ഭാഷകളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d മറ്റു ഭാഷകളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d സാധ്യതയ ഇങ്ങനെയാണ്, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് മറ്റു ഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് അഭ്യസിപ്പിക്കാനും വീണ്ടും വ്യത്യസ്ത ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d കി ഈ വ്യത്യസ്ത ചിത്രങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി വിവരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d NLSSum (ചുരുക്കത്തിനായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d തിരയുന്നതിനായി പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു), അത്  നമ്മള്\u200d MLSUM, വികിലിങ്ക്വാ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പല ഭാഷ വെടിവെക്കപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഈ രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d', 'pl': 'W zerowej wielojęzycznej ekstrakcyjnej streszczeniu tekstu model jest zazwyczaj trenowany na angielskim zestawie danych streszczenia, a następnie stosowany na zestawach danych streszczenia innych języków. Biorąc pod uwagę angielskie złote streszczenia i dokumenty, etykiety na poziomie zdań są generowane zwykle przy użyciu heurystyki. Jednakże te jednojęzyczne etykiety tworzone na angielskich zbiorach danych mogą nie być optymalne dla zbiorów danych innych języków, ponieważ istnieje rozbieżność składni lub semantyczna między różnymi językami. W ten sposób możliwe jest przetłumaczenie angielskiego zbioru danych na inne języki i ponowne uzyskanie różnych zestawów etykiet za pomocą heurystyki. Aby w pełni wykorzystać informacje z tych różnych zestawów etykiet, proponujemy NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), które wspólnie uczy się wag hierarchicznych dla tych różnych zestawów etykiet wraz z naszym modelem podsumowania. Prowadzimy wielojęzyczne eksperymenty podsumowujące zero-shot na zbiorach danych MLSUM i WikiLingua i osiągamy najnowocześniejsze wyniki wykorzystując zarówno ludzkie, jak i automatyczne oceny tych dwóch zbiorów danych.', 'ro': 'În rezumarea textului extractiv multilingv zero-shot, un model este de obicei instruit pe setul de date de rezumare în limba engleză și apoi aplicat pe seturile de date de rezumare din alte limbi. Având în vedere rezumatele și documentele aurului englez, etichetele la nivel de frază pentru rezumarea extractivă sunt generate de obicei folosind euristica. Cu toate acestea, aceste etichete monolingve create pe seturi de date în limba engleză ar putea să nu fie optime pe seturi de date din alte limbi, deoarece există discrepanța sintactică sau semantică între diferitele limbi. În acest fel, este posibil să se traducă setul de date în limba engleză în alte limbi și să se obțină din nou seturi diferite de etichete folosind euristica. Pentru a valorifica pe deplin informațiile acestor seturi diferite de etichete, propunem NLSsum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), care împreună învață greutățile ierarhice pentru aceste seturi diferite de etichete împreună cu modelul nostru de rezumare. Realizăm experimente multilingve de rezumare zero-shot pe seturi de date MLSUM și WikiLingua și obținem rezultate de ultimă oră utilizând atât evaluări umane, cât și automate în aceste două seturi de date.', 'no': 'I tillegg til «0-shot»-ekstraktiv tekstsamansering, vert eit modell vanlegvis utlært på datasett for samansering av engelsk og så brukt på samanseringsdata av andre språk. Given engelske gullssamandringar og dokument, setningsnivåetikettar for ekstraktivt samandringar genererer vanlegvis med heuristikk. Desse monolinguske merkelappene som er laga på engelske datasett kan ikkje vera optimal på datasett av andre språk, for det finst syntaksisk eller semantisk skilnaden mellom ulike språk. I denne måten er det mogleg å oversette engelske datasettet til andre språk og få ulike sett merkelappar igjen med heuristikk. For å fullstendig levera informasjonen om desse ulike setta merkelappar, foreslår vi NLSSum (Neuraletikett Søk etter sammendrag), som lærer heirararkiske vekt for desse ulike setta merkelappar saman med sammendragmodellen vår. Vi gjer fleirspråkssamanseringsprøym på MLSUM og WikiLingua-datasett, og vi oppnår tilstanden av kunsten med både menneske og automatiske evalueringar i disse to datasettene.', 'si': 'ශූර්ය- ශෝට් විශාල භාෂාවික පැත්තක් සංශ්\u200dයාවයෙන්, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සංශ්\u200dයාව සංශ්\u200dයාවයෙන් සංශ්\u200dයාව ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ රත්තු සම්පූර්ණය සහ වාර්තාව, වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා වාර්තාවක් ලේබල් සාමාන්\u200dය වි නමුත්, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සැට් වල සිද්ධ වුනු මෙම එක භාෂාවක් ලෙබෙල්ල් අනිත් භාෂාවක් දත්ත සැට් වල හොඳින් නොවෙයි, ඒ මෙහෙම විදියට, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සැට වෙනස් භාෂාවට පරිවර්තනය කරන්න සමහර වෙනස් ලේබල් සැට් ආයෙත් හෙයුරිස මේ වෙනස් ලෙබෙල්ලගේ තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, අපි NLSSum (න්\u200dයූරාල ලේබෙල් සංවේදනය සඳහා සංවේදනය සඳහා සංවේ අපි මිලිසුම් සහ විකිලින්ගුවා දත්ත සේට් වලින් ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ශූන්ය විස්තර පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, අපි මිනිස්සු සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිත', 'so': 'Tusaale ahaan xarunta qoraalka oo luuqadaha kala duduwan waxaa lagu baraa qoraalka qoraalka ee Ingiriiska lagu soo qorayo, markaasna waxaa lagu codsadaa qoraalka macluumaadka summarinta ee luuqadaha kale. Jardiinooyinka dahabka ee Ingiriiska la siiyo iyo dukumentiyada, waxaa inta badan lagu isticmaalaa alaabta heerka xafiiska ah ee la soo saaro. Si kastaba ha ahaatee calaamadahan afka ingiriisiga lagu sameeyo waxey suurtogal u noqon karaan macluumaadka kooxaha luuqadaha kale, waayo, waxaa jira iskala soocnaanta ama kala duwan luqadaha kala duduwan. Sidan darteed waxaa suurtogal ah in lagu turjumo macluumaadka ingiriiska oo luqado kale lagu qoro islamarkaasna lagu helo alaabyo kala duduwan oo lagu isticmaalo hiuristic. Si aad u buuxsanto macluumaadka alaabyadan kala duduwan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa NLSSum (Neural Label Search Summariisiga), kaas oo si wada jir ah u barta miisaan hierarchical ah oo u qoran alaabtaas oo kala duduwan sameynaysa sameynta noocyadan summarinta. Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaanka jimicsiga oo luuqadaha kala duduwan oo MLSUM iyo WikiLingua ku qoran, waxaana sameynaa arimaha arimaha farshaxanka, si aan u isticmaalno qiimeynta biniaadamka iyo si bilowga ah labadaas sawirada.', 'sv': 'I noll-shot flersprﾃ･kig extraktiv textsammanfattning utbildas en modell vanligtvis i engelska sammanfattningsdatauppsﾃ､ttningar och tillﾃ､mpas sedan pﾃ･ sammanfattningsdatauppsﾃ､ttningar av andra sprﾃ･k. Med engelska guldsammanfattningar och dokument genereras vanligtvis etiketter pﾃ･ meningsnivﾃ･ fﾃｶr extraktiv sammanfattning med hjﾃ､lp av heuristik. Dessa ensprﾃ･kiga etiketter som skapas pﾃ･ engelska datauppsﾃ､ttningar kanske inte ﾃ､r optimala pﾃ･ datauppsﾃ､ttningar pﾃ･ andra sprﾃ･k, eftersom det finns den syntaktiska eller semantiska avvikelsen mellan olika sprﾃ･k. Pﾃ･ sﾃ･ sﾃ､tt ﾃ､r det mﾃｶjligt att ﾃｶversﾃ､tta den engelska datauppsﾃ､ttningen till andra sprﾃ･k och fﾃ･ olika uppsﾃ､ttningar etiketter igen med hjﾃ､lp av heuristik. Fﾃｶr att fullt ut utnyttja informationen frﾃ･n dessa olika uppsﾃ､ttningar etiketter fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi NLSsum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), som tillsammans lﾃ､r sig hierarkiska vikter fﾃｶr dessa olika uppsﾃ､ttningar etiketter tillsammans med vﾃ･r sammanfattningsmodell. Vi genomfﾃｶr flersprﾃ･kiga noll-skott sammanfattningsexperiment pﾃ･ MLSUM och WikiLingua datauppsﾃ､ttningar, och vi uppnﾃ･r toppmoderna resultat med hjﾃ､lp av bﾃ･de mﾃ､nskliga och automatiska utvﾃ､rderingar ﾃｶver dessa tvﾃ･ datauppsﾃ､ttningar.', 'sr': 'U sažetku multijezičkih ekstraktivnih tekstova, model se obično obučava na setu podataka za sažetanje engleskog jezika i zatim se primjenjuje na sažetke podataka drugih jezika. S obzirom na sažetke i dokumente engleskog zlata, etikete na nivou rečenica za ekstraktivnu sažetak obično se stvaraju koristeći heuristiku. Međutim, ove monojezičke etikete koje su stvorene na engleskim podacima možda ne budu optimalne na setima podataka drugih jezika, jer postoji sintaktična ili semantična razlika između različitih jezika. Tako je moguće prevesti engleski set podataka na drugi jezici i ponovo dobiti različite sete etiketa koristeći heuristiku. Da bismo potpuno uticali na informacije o ovim različitim setima etiketa, predlažemo NLSSum (Neuralni etiketi za potragu za sažetvom), koji zajedno uči hijerarhičke težine za te različite sete etiketi zajedno sa našim model sažetvovanja. Vodimo višejezičke rezultate rezultata za sažetak nula snimka na MLSUM i WikiLingua podataka, i postigli smo rezultate umjetnosti koristeći ljudske i automatske procjene na ovim dvama podataka.', 'ta': 'In zero-shot multilingual extractive text summarization, a model is typically trained on English summarization dataset and then applied on summarization datasets of other languages.  ஆங்கிலத்தில் தங்கக் கூடிய சுருக்கங்கள் மற்றும் ஆவணங்கள் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, வாக்கு- மட்டத்திற்கான சுருக்கம் சுருக் ஆனால், இந்த ஆங்கிலத்தின் தரவுத்தளங்களில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மொழிமொழிகள் மற்ற மொழிகளின் தரவுத்தளங்களில் விருப்பமாக இருக்கலாம், ஏனெனில் வ இந்த வழியில், ஆங்கிலத்தின் தரவு அமைப்பை மற்ற மொழிகளுக்கு மொழியில் மொழிபெயர்க்க முடியும் மற்றும் வித்தியாசம இந்த வித்தியாசமான சிட்டைகளின் தகவல்களை முழுமையாக கொடுக்க நாம் NLSSum (சுருக்கத்திற்கான சிட்டையை தேடுகிறோம்) என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது சுருக்கும்  MLSUM மற்றும் விகிலிங்குவா தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் பல மொழி பூஜ்ஜிய புள்ளி சுருக்கல் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். இந்த இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளில் மனித மற்றும் தானாகவே', 'ur': 'صفر-شٹ multilingual extractive text summarization میں، ایک مدل انگلیسی جمع ڈیٹ سٹ پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے اور پھر دوسری زبانوں کی جمع کرنا ڈیٹ سٹ پر استعمال کی جاتی ہے. انگلیسی سونڈ کے ذریعے اور لاسوندوں کے ذریعے، انگلیسی سونڈ کے ذریعے اضافہ کے ذریعے لئبل معمولاً ہوریستیک کے مطابق پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں. لیکن انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ پر پیدا کئے ہوئے یہ ایک زبان لیبل دوسری زبانوں کے ڈاٹ سٹ پر اچھی نہیں ہوسکتے، اس لئے کہ مختلف زبانوں کے درمیان سینٹکتیک یا سیمنٹی اختلاف ہے. اس طرح، انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ کو دوسری زبانوں میں ترجمہ کرنا ممکن ہے اور دوبارہ ہوریستیک کے مطابق مختلف لیبل سٹ حاصل کرنا ہے. ان مختلف لئبلوں کی معلومات کو پوری طور پر لکھنے کے لئے، ہم NLSSum (نیورال لئبل جہاد کے لئے) پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ان مختلف لئبلوں کے ساتھ ان مختلف لئبلوں کے لئے ہیرارک وزن کی تعلیم سکھاتا ہے، اور ہمارے ذخیره مدل کے ساتھ۔ ہم MLSUM اور ویکیلینگوا ڈیٹ سٹ پر بہت سی زبان صفر-شٹ کے ذریعہ آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور ہم ان دو ڈیٹ سٹ میں انسان اور اتماٹی ارزیابی کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Trong việc tổng kết văn bản khai thác ngôn ngữ đa dạng bằng không, một mô hình thường được đào tạo về tập tin tổng hợp tiếng Anh và sau đó được áp dụng vào các bộ dữ liệu tóm tắt của các ngôn ngữ khác. Theo những bản tóm tắt và tài liệu bằng vàng Anh, những nhãn hiệu cấp hạn chế cung cấp khai thác thường được tạo ra bằng thần kinh. Tuy nhiên, những nhãn độc ngôn ngữ được tạo ra trên các bộ dữ liệu Anh không phải là tối ưu trên các bộ dữ liệu khác nhau, vì có sự khác biệt cấu tạo theo ngữ pháp hay ngữ pháp. Bằng cách này, có thể dịch bộ dữ liệu tiếng Anh thành những ngôn ngữ khác nhau và lấy các tập thể khác nhau bằng thần kinh. Để thao tác đầy đủ thông tin của các loại nhãn khác nhau này, chúng tôi đề nghị NLSSum (Tìm các thẻ hình thái thần kinh để đạt điểm chung), nơi học các tạ lượng thứ tự với mô hình tổng quát của chúng ta. Chúng tôi thực hiện các thí nghiệm tổng quát đa dạng không quay trên các tập tin MLSUM và WikiLLingua, và chúng tôi đạt được kết quả hiện đại nhờ vào cả đánh giá người lẫn tự động trên hai bộ dữ liệu này.', 'uz': "Name Inglizcha gull muhitirlari va ҳужжатлар берилган, kichiklashtirish uchun maxfiy soʻzni tahrirlash tugmalari odatda heuristik yordamida yaratiladi. Lekin ingliz maʼlumotlar tarkibida yaratilgan oddiy luglar boshqa tillarda maʼlumotlar tarkibida optimal emas, chunki har xil tillar orasidagi syntikk yoki semantik ajratilik mavjud emas. Bu yerda ingliz tili maʼlumotlar tarjimasini boshqa tillarda tarjima qilish mumkin va heuristik yordamida boshqa bir xil satrlarni olish mumkin. Ushbu boshqa tugmalar tarkibini butunlay yordam qilish uchun biz NLSSum (Hisobot qidirish uchun nuural yorlarni qidirish) talab qilamiz. Bu tugmalar birikmasi modeli bilan birlashtirilgan hierarchik vektlarini o'rganadi. Biz MLSUM va WikiLingua maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi bir necha tildagi nuqta o'zgarishni bajaramiz va biz bu ikkita maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi inson va avtomatik qiymatlar bilan foydalanamiz.", 'bg': 'При нулевото многоезично обобщаване на екстрактивни текстове, моделът обикновено се обучава върху набор от данни за обобщаване на английски език и след това се прилага върху набори от данни за обобщаване на други езици. Предвид английските златни резюмета и документи, етикетите на ниво изречение за извличане обикновено се генерират с помощта на евристика. Въпреки това, тези едноезични етикети, създадени на английски набори от данни, може да не са оптимални за набори от данни на други езици, тъй като съществува синтактично или семантично несъответствие между различните езици. По този начин е възможно английският набор от данни да се преведе на други езици и отново да се получат различни набори от етикети с помощта на евристика. За да се възползваме напълно от информацията за тези различни набори етикети, предлагаме Търсене на неврални етикети за обобщаване, което съвместно научава йерархични тежести за тези различни набори етикети заедно с нашия модел за обобщаване. Провеждаме многоезични експерименти за обобщаване с нулеви изстрели върху набори от данни и постигаме най-съвременни резултати, използвайки както човешки, така и автоматични оценки в тези два набора от данни.', 'da': 'I nul-shot flersproget ekstraktiv tekst resuméering trænes en model typisk i engelsk opsummeringsdatasæt og anvendes derefter på opsummeringsdatasæt af andre sprog. Med engelske guldresuméer og dokumenter genereres etiketter på sætningsniveau til ekstraktiv resuméering normalt ved hjælp af heuristik. Disse ensprogede etiketter, der er oprettet på engelske datasæt, er imidlertid ikke optimale på datasæt af andre sprog, da der er den syntaktiske eller semantiske uoverensstemmelse mellem forskellige sprog. På den måde er det muligt at oversætte det engelske datasæt til andre sprog og få forskellige sæt etiketter igen ved hjælp af heuristik. For fuldt ud at udnytte oplysningerne om disse forskellige sæt etiketter, foreslår vi NLSsum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), som i fællesskab lærer hierarkiske vægte for disse forskellige sæt etiketter sammen med vores opsummeringsmodel. Vi gennemfører flersprogede nulskudsopsummeringseksperimenter på MLSUM og WikiLingua datasæt, og vi opnår state-of-the-art resultater ved hjælp af både menneskelige og automatiske evalueringer på tværs af disse to datasæt.', 'nl': 'Bij zero-shot meertalige extractieve tekstsamenvatting wordt een model meestal getraind op Engelse samenvattingsdataset en vervolgens toegepast op samenvattingsdatasets van andere talen. Gezien Engelse gouden samenvattingen en documenten, worden zinnenabels voor extractieve samenvatting meestal gegenereerd met behulp van heuristieken. Deze eentalige labels die zijn gemaakt op Engelse datasets kunnen echter niet optimaal zijn op datasets van andere talen, omdat er syntactische of semantische discrepantie is tussen verschillende talen. Op deze manier is het mogelijk om de Engelse dataset te vertalen naar andere talen en weer verschillende sets labels te verkrijgen met behulp van heuristiek. Om optimaal gebruik te maken van de informatie van deze verschillende sets labels, stellen we NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization) voor, dat gezamenlijk hiërarchische gewichten leert voor deze verschillende sets labels samen met ons samenvattingsmodel. We voeren meertalige zero-shot samenvattingsexperimenten uit op MLSUM en WikiLingua datasets, en we bereiken state-of-the-art resultaten met behulp van zowel menselijke als automatische evaluaties over deze twee datasets.', 'hr': 'U sažetku multijezičkih ekstraktivnih teksta, model se obično obučava na setu podataka za sažetanje engleskog jezika, a zatim se primjenjuje na sažetke podataka drugih jezika. S obzirom na sažetke i dokumente engleskog zlata, etikete na razini kazne za ekstraktivnu sažetku obično se stvaraju koristeći heuristiku. Međutim, te monojezičke etikete koje su stvorene na engleskim podacima možda nisu optimalne na datasetima drugih jezika, jer postoji sintaktična ili semantična razlika između različitih jezika. Na taj način, moguće je prevoditi engleski set podataka na drugi jezici i ponovo dobiti različite sete etiketa koristeći heuristiku. Za potpunu primjenu informacija o ovim različitim setima etiketa, predlažemo NLSSum (Neuralna etiketa potražnja za sažetvom), koja zajedno uči hijerarhičke težine za te različite sete etiketa zajedno s našim model sažetvovanja. Provodimo multijezičke rezultate rezultata za sažetak nule snimke na MLSUM i WikiLingua podacima, i postigli smo rezultate stanja umjetnosti koristeći ljudske i automatske procjene na te dvije podatke.', 'de': 'Bei der zero-shot mehrsprachigen extraktiven Textzusammenfassung wird ein Modell typischerweise auf englischen Zusammenfassungsdatensatz trainiert und dann auf Zusammenfassungsdatensammlungen anderer Sprachen angewendet. Bei englischen Gold-Zusammenfassungen und Dokumenten werden Satz-Etiketten für extraktive Zusammenfassungen in der Regel mithilfe von Heuristiken generiert. Allerdings sind diese monolingualen Labels, die auf englischen Datensätzen erstellt werden, möglicherweise nicht optimal für Datensätze anderer Sprachen, da es die syntaktische oder semantische Diskrepanz zwischen verschiedenen Sprachen gibt. Auf diese Weise ist es möglich, den englischen Datensatz in andere Sprachen zu übersetzen und mithilfe von Heuristiken wieder verschiedene Labelsätze zu erhalten. Um die Informationen dieser verschiedenen Labelsätze voll auszuschöpfen, schlagen wir NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization) vor, das zusammen mit unserem Zusammenfassungsmodell hierarchische Gewichte für diese verschiedenen Labelsätze lernt. Wir führen mehrsprachige Zero-Shot Summaryzation Experimente an MLSUM- und WikiLingua-Datensätzen durch und erzielen State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse durch menschliche und automatische Auswertungen über diese beiden Datensätze.', 'id': 'Dalam penglihatan teks ekstraktif multibahasa bernilai nol, model biasanya dilatih pada set data penglihatan Inggris dan kemudian diterapkan pada set data penglihatan bahasa lain. Mengingat ringkasan emas Inggris dan dokumen, label tingkat kalimat untuk ringkasan ekstraktif biasanya dihasilkan menggunakan heuristik. Namun, label monobahasa ini yang diciptakan pada set data Inggris mungkin tidak optimal pada set data bahasa lain, karena ada diskrepansi sintaktik atau semantis antara bahasa yang berbeda. In this way, it is possible to translate the English dataset to other languages and obtain different sets of labels again using heuristics.  Untuk menyelesaikan informasi dari set label yang berbeda ini, kami mengusulkan NLSSum (Label Neural Search for Summarization), yang bersama-sama belajar berat hierarkis untuk set label yang berbeda ini bersama-sama dengan model summarization kami. We conduct multilingual zero-shot summarization experiments on MLSUM and WikiLingua datasets, and we achieve state-of-the-art results using both human and automatic evaluations across these two datasets.', 'fa': 'در جمع کردن متن خارج از زبان صفر، یک مدل معمولاً بر مجموعه داده\u200cهای جمع کردن انگلیسی آموزش می\u200cشود و سپس بر مجموعه داده\u200cهای جمع کردن زبان\u200cهای دیگر کاربرد می\u200cشود. با توجه به جمع طلا و مدارک انگلیسی، نقاشی سطح جمع\u200cآوری برای جمع\u200cآوری خارجی معمولاً با استفاده از هوریستیک تولید می\u200cشوند. با این حال، این برچسب\u200cهای تنها زبانی که روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای انگلیسی ایجاد شده\u200cاند ممکن است بر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دیگر زبان\u200cها بهترین باشد، زیرا اختلاف سنتاکتیک یا semantic بین زبانهای مختلف وجود دارد. در این صورت، ممکن است که مجموعه داده\u200cهای انگلیسی را به زبانهای دیگر ترجمه کنیم و مجموعه\u200cهای برچسب\u200cهای مختلف را دوباره با استفاده از هوریستیک برگیریم. برای تأثیر اطلاعات این مجموعه\u200cهای مختلف برچسب\u200cها، ما NLSSum (جستجوی برچسب\u200cهای عصبی برای جمع\u200cآوری) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با همدیگر وزن\u200cهای معمولی برای این مجموعه\u200cهای برچسب\u200cهای مختلف با مدل جمع\u200cآوری ما را یاد می\u200cگیرد. ما آزمایش\u200cهای تعداد زیادی از صفر زبان را روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای MLSUM و WikiLingua انجام می\u200cدهیم، و نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را با استفاده از ارزیابی\u200cهای انسان و خودکار در این دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده می\u200cرسانیم.', 'ko': '제로 포 다중 언어 추출 텍스트 요약에서 모델은 보통 영어 요약 데이터 집합에서 훈련한 다음에 다른 언어의 요약 데이터 집합에 응용된다.영문 황금 요약과 문서를 정하고 요약을 추출하는 문장급 라벨은 보통 계발식으로 생성됩니다.그러나 영어 데이터 집합에 만들어진 이 단어 라벨들은 다른 언어의 데이터 집합에서 가장 좋지 않을 수도 있다. 왜냐하면 서로 다른 언어 사이에 문법이나 의미 차이가 존재하기 때문이다.이런 방식을 통해 영어 데이터 집합을 다른 언어로 번역하고 계발식으로 다시 다른 탭 집합을 얻을 수 있다.이러한 다양한 태그 세트의 정보를 최대한 활용하기 위해 다양한 태그 세트의 계층적 가중치를 요약 모델과 함께 학습하는 NLSSum(Neural Label Search for Summation)을 제안했습니다.우리는 MLSUM과 WikiLingua 데이터 집합에서 다국어 제로 렌즈 요약 실험을 실시했고 이 두 데이터 집합에서 인공과 자동 평가를 사용하여 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Katika muhtasari wa ujumbe wa maandishi yanayopigwa kwa lugha za asili, mfano hufundishwa mara nyingi kwenye seti ya taarifa za muhtasari wa Kiingereza na kisha inatumika kwenye seti za taarifa za muhtasari za lugha nyingine. Given English gold summaries and documents, sentence-level labels for extractive summarization are usually generated using heuristics.  Hata hivyo, alama hizi za lugha za kigeni zilizotengenezwa kwenye seti za takwimu za Kiingereza haziwezekani kuwa bora kwenye seti za taarifa za lugha nyingine, kwa sababu kuna utofauti wa lugha tofauti au tofauti. Kwa namna hii, inawezekana kutafsiri taarifa za Kiingereza kwa lugha nyingine na kupata seti mbalimbali kwa kutumia heuristi. Ili kutumia taarifa za seti hizi tofauti za maabara, tunapendekeza NLSSum (Tafuta Label ya Neural Search for Summary), ambazo kwa pamoja inajifunza mizani za kiutaratibu kwa ajili ya seti hizi tofauti za maabara pamoja na modeli yetu ya muhtasari. Tunafanya majaribio ya uchunguzi wa lugha sifuri katika seti za data za MLSUM na WikiLingua, na tunapata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwa kutumia utafiti wa binadamu na binadamu katika seti hizi mbili.', 'tr': '0-atjyk multi dillerde gaýd edilen metin toplamynda, adatça iňlis dillerde bir nusga görkezilýär we soňra başga dillerde buýruk verileri girişinde uygulanýar. Iňlisçe altyn holasasy we senediň görkezilişinde, sözlem derejesi golaýlaşyk üçin adatça heuristikler ullanýar. Ýöne bu monolingüň etiketleri Iňlis datum setirlerinde döredilen başga diller barda optimaly däl, sebäbi farklı diller arasynda syntaktik ýa-da semantik bir döwlet bar. Bu şekilde, iňlisler veri setirini başga dillere terjime etmek we ýene heuristik ulanarak başga dürli etiketleri alıp biler. Bu dürli etiketlerniň maglumatyny tamamlamak üçin, NLSSum (Neural etiket Arama Samuralama üçin) teklip etmek üçin bu dürli etiketlerniň iýerarhiýa ağırlygyny biziň toplama modelimiz bilen öwrenýär. Biz MLSUM we WikiLingua veri setirlerinde birnäçe dilli 0-atly jemgyýet deneylerini çykardyk we bu iki veri setirlerinde hem adamlaryň hem awtomatik deňlenmelerini ulanyp başarypdyk.', 'sq': 'Në përmbledhjen e tekstit ekstraktiv me zero-shot shumëgjuhës, një model është tipikisht trajnuar në grupin e të dhënave të përmbledhjes angleze dhe pastaj aplikuar në grupet e të dhënave të përmbledhjes të gjuhëve të tjera. Duke pasur parasysh përmbledhjet dhe dokumentet e artë angleze, etiketat e nivelit të fjalëve për përmbledhjen ekstraktive zakonisht gjenerohen duke përdorur heuristikën. Megjithatë, këto etiketa monogjuhësore të krijuara në grupet e të dhënave angleze mund të mos jenë optimale në grupet e të dhënave të gjuhëve të tjera, sepse ka diskrepancë sintaktike apo semantike midis gjuhëve të ndryshme. Në këtë mënyrë, është e mundur të përkthehet kompleti i të dhënave angleze në gjuhë të tjera dhe të marrësh komplete të ndryshme etiketash përsëri duke përdorur heuristikën. To fully leverage the information of these different sets of labels, we propose NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), which jointly learns hierarchical weights for these different sets of labels together with our summarization model.  Ne kryejmë eksperimente shumëgjuhëse të përmbledhjes zero-shot në MLSUM dhe WikiLingua datasets, dhe arrijmë rezultate më të larta duke përdorur vlerësime njerëzore dhe automatike në këto dy datasets.', 'af': "In nul-skoot veelvuldige ekstraktiewe teks opsomming, is 'n model tipies opgelei op Engelske opsomming datastel en dan aangepas op opsomming datastel van ander tale. Gien Engels goue opsommings en dokumente, sentence-level etikette vir ekstraktiewe opsomming word gewoonlik genereer deur heuristics. Maar hierdie monolinguele etikette wat op Engelse datastelle geskep is dalk mag nie optimal wees op datastel van ander tale, want daar is die sintakteel of semantiese skielikheid tussen verskillende tale. In hierdie manier is dit moontlik om die Engelse datastel na ander tale te vertaal en verskillende stel etikette weer te kry met heuristiek. Om die inligting van hierdie verskillende stel etikette volledig te verwyder, voorstel ons NLSSum (Neurale etikette Soek vir Opsomming), wat joint leer hierarkies weegte vir hierdie verskillende stel etikette saam met ons opsomming model. Ons doen multitaalske nul-skoot opsomming eksperimente op MLSUM en WikiLingua datastelle, en ons bereik staat-van-kuns resultate met gebruik van beide menslike en automatiese evaluasies oor hierdie twee datastelle.", 'am': 'በzero-shot multilingual extractive text summarization, model በተለመደው በই-ንግሊዝኛ ማሳተሚያ ዳታዎችን ያስተምራል እና በኋላም በሌላ ቋንቋዎች ማጠቃለያ ዳታዎችን ይጠቅማል፡፡ እንግሊዝኛ የወርቅ ማጠቃለያ እና ሰነዶች በተሰጠ ጊዜ የፍርድ ደረጃ ምልክቶች በተለየ አርጤክስነትን በመጠቀም ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህ በንግግሊዝኛ ዳታተሮች ላይ የተፈጠሩ የአንደኛ ቋንቋዎች የዳታ ማተሚያ አይቻሉም፤ በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች መካከል ስናታዊ ወይም semantic ጥያቄ አለውና፡፡ እንደዚህ፣ እንግሊዘኛ ዳታተሮችን ወደ ሌሎች ቋንቋዎች መተርጉም ይችላል፣ የተለየ ደረጃ ምልክቶችን ደግሞ በሀሪስቲክ ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ እነዚህን የተለያዩ የምልክቶች መረጃዎችን ለመሙላት እናስገድዳለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች በMLSUM እና WikiLingua ዳታተሮች ላይ የቁመት ፈተና እናደርጋለን፤ በዚህም በሁለቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ የሰው እና በራሱ ማስታወሻ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Զերոլեզու բազմալեզու արտադրող տեքստի համառոտագրության մեջ մոդելը սովորաբար ուսուցանվում է անգլերենի համառոտագրման տվյալների համառոտագրման մեջ և հետո կիրառում է այլ լեզուների համառոտագրման տվյալների համառոտագրման մեջ: Հաշվի առնելով անգլերեն ոսկու համառոտագրությունները և փաստաթղթերը, նախադասությունների մակարդակի պիտակները հանդիսանում են հիորիստիկայի օգնությամբ: Այնուամենայնիվ, անգլերենի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա ստեղծված այս միալեզու պիտակները հնարավոր չէ, որ օպտիմալ լինեն այլ լեզուների տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որովհետև տարբեր լեզուների միջև կա սինտակտիկ կամ սեմանտիկ տարբերություն: Այս կերպ հնարավոր է անգլերեն տվյալների համակարգը թարգմանել այլ լեզվով և նորից ստանալ տարբեր պիտակներ՝ օգտագործելով հորիստիկ: Որպեսզի լիովին օգտագործենք այս տարբեր պիտակների համակարգերի տեղեկատվությունը, մենք առաջարկում ենք Նեյրալ պիտակների համառոտագրման որոնումը, որը միասին սովորում է այս տարբեր պիտակների համակարգերի հիերարխիկ կշիռները միասին մեր համառոտագրման մոդելի հետ: Մենք կատարում ենք բազմալեզու զրոյական համառոտագրման փորձարկումներ MLSuM-ի և WiKiLinGua-ի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, և մենք հասնում ենք ամենաբարձր արդյունքների՝ օգտագործելով մարդկային և ավտոմատիկ գնահատումներ այս երկու տվյալների համակարգերի միջև:', 'az': 'Sıfır-atlı çoxlu dil ekstraktif metin toplantısında, bir model İngiliz toplantısı verilər qutusunda təhsil edilir və sonra digər dillərin toplantısı qutusunda istifadə edilir. İngilizə altın yığışdırmaları və belələri tərzlərinə görə, ekstraktif yığışdırma üçün cümə-seviyyəti etiketləri genellikle heuristik vasitəsilə yaradılır. Ancaq bu monodil etiketlər İngilis veri qurularında yaradılmış başqa dillərin veri qurularında optimal olmayabilir, çünki bunun üçün müxtəlif dillər arasında sintaktik və semantik fərqliyi var. Bu şekilde İngilizə verilən qutusu başqa dillərə çevirir və heuristik vasitəsilə yenidən fərqli etiketlər alır. Bu müxtəlif etiketlərin məlumatlarını tamamlamaq üçün, NLSSum (NLSSum etiketi Qısqam Araması) təklif edirik ki, bu müxtəlif etiketlər üçün hiyerarşik ağırlarını birlikdə toplama modelimizlə öyrənir. Biz MLSUM və WikiLingua veri qurularında çoxlu dil sıfır-fırlatma təcrübələrini və bu iki veri quruları ilə insanlar və avtomatik təcrübələrini istifadə edərək müəyyən etdik.', 'bn': 'শুধুমাত্র বহুভাষায় এক্সট্রেক্ট ট টেক্সট সংক্ষেপের মধ্যে একটি মডেল সাধারণত ইংরেজী সংক্ষিপ্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত সং ইংরেজি সোনার সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ এবং নথিপত্র দিয়ে সাধারণত হিউরিস্টিক ব্যবহার করে কারাদণ্ড-স্তরের লেবেল তৈরি করা হয়। তবে ইংরেজি ডাটাসেটে তৈরি করা এই মোনোলিভাল লেবেল অন্যান্য ভাষার ডাটাসেটের ব্যাপারে অপ্রায়িক নয়, কারণ বিভিন্ন ভাষার মধ্যে সাধারণ এইভাবে ইংরেজি ডাটাসেট অন্য ভাষায় অনুবাদ করা সম্ভব এবং হিউরিস্টিক্স ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন ধরনের লেবেল পেতে পারে। To fully leverage the information of these different sets of labels, we propose NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), which jointly learns hierarchical weights for these different sets of labels together with our summarization model.  আমরা MLSUM এবং উইকিলিঙ্গুয়া ডাটাসেটে বহুভাষায় শুটের শুটের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি এবং এই দুটি ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে আমরা মানুষ এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয় মূল্', 'ca': "En una resumerització multilingüe de textos extractius amb fotografies zero, un model és típicament entrenat en un conjunt de dades de resumerització anglesa i després aplicat en conjunts de dades de resumerització d'altres llengües. Tenint en compte els resums d'or anglès i els documents, les etiquetes de nivell de frases per a la resumensió extractiva normalment es generen fent servir heurística. No obstant això, aquestes etiquetes monolingües creades en conjunts de dades angleses potser no són optimals en conjunts de dades d'altres llengües, perquè hi ha la discrepancia sinàctica o semàntica entre les diferents llengües. D'aquesta manera, és possible traduir el conjunt de dades anglesa a altres llengües i obtenir diferents conjunts d'etiquetes amb heurística. Per aprofitar plenament la informació d'aquests diferents conjunts d'etiquetes, proposem NLSSum (Busca de Resumen en Etiquetes Neurals), que juntament aprenen pes jeràrquics d'aquests diferents conjunts d'etiquetes juntament amb el nostre model de resum. We conduct multilingual zero-shot summarization experiments on MLSUM and WikiLingua datasets, and we achieve state-of-the-art results using both human and automatic evaluations across these two datasets.", 'bs': 'U sažetku multijezičkih ekstraktivnih tekstova, model se obično obučava na setu podataka za sažetanje engleskog jezika, a zatim se primjenjuje na sažetke podataka drugih jezika. S obzirom na sažetke i dokumente engleskog zlata, etikete na nivou kazne za ekstraktivnu sažetku obično se stvaraju koristeći heuristiku. Međutim, te monojezičke etikete koje su stvorene na engleskim podacima možda ne budu optimalne na datasetima drugih jezika, jer postoji sintaktična ili semantična razlika između različitih jezika. Na taj način, moguće je prevesti engleski set podataka na drugi jezici i ponovo dobiti različite sete etiketa koristeći heuristiku. Da bi se potpuno uključili informacije o ovim različitim setima etiketa, predlažemo NLSSum (Neuralna etiketa potražnja za Summarizacijom), koja zajedno uči hijerarhičke težine za te različite sete etiketa zajedno sa našim modelom summarizacije. Vodimo multijezičke rezultate rezultata za sažetak nula snimka na MLSUM i WikiLingua podacima, i postigli smo rezultate stanja umjetnosti koristeći ljudske i automatske procjene u ovim dvama podacima.', 'cs': 'Při nulovém vícejazyčném extrakčním souhrnu textu je model obvykle trénován na anglické souhrnné datové sadě a pak aplikován na souhrnné datové sady jiných jazyků. Vzhledem k anglickým zlatým souhrnům a dokumentům jsou etikety na úrovni vět pro extraktivní souhrn obvykle generovány pomocí heuristiky. Tyto jednojjazyčné štítky vytvořené na anglických datových sadách však nemusí být optimální pro datové sady jiných jazyků, protože existuje syntaktická nebo sémantická nesrovnalost mezi různými jazyky. Tímto způsobem je možné přeložit anglický datový soubor do jiných jazyků a opět získat různé sady etiket pomocí heuristiky. Pro plné využití informací těchto různých sad štítků navrhujeme NLSsum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), které se společně učí hierarchické váhy pro tyto různé sady štítků společně s naším souhrnným modelem. Provádíme vícejazyčné nulové souhrnné experimenty na datových sadách MLSUM a WikiLingua a dosahujeme nejmodernějších výsledků pomocí lidského i automatického vyhodnocení napříč těmito dvěma datovými sadami.', 'et': 'Nullshot mitmekeelse ekstraktiivse teksti kokkuvõtte puhul koolitatakse mudelit tavaliselt inglise keele kokkuvõtliku andmekogumi kohta ja rakendatakse seejärel teiste keelte kokkuvõtliku andmekogumitele. Arvestades inglise kuldseid kokkuvõtteid ja dokumente, genereeritakse lausetaseme etiketid ekstraktivõime kokkuvõtmiseks tavaliselt heuristika abil. Kuid need inglise keele andmekogumites loodud ühekeelsed märgised ei pruugi olla optimaalsed teiste keelte andmekogumite puhul, sest erinevate keelte vahel esineb süntaktiline või semantiline lahknevus. Sel viisil on võimalik inglise keele andmekogumit tõlkida teistesse keeltesse ja saada uuesti erinevaid märgistuskomplekte heuristika abil. Nende erinevate siltide komplektide teabe täielikuks ärakasutamiseks pakume välja NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), mis õpib koos meie kokkuvõtlusmudeliga nende erinevate siltide komplektide hierarhilisi kaalusid. Me teeme mitmekeelseid null-shot kokkuvõtte katseid MLSUM ja WikiLingua andmekogumitega ning saavutame tipptasemel tulemusi, kasutades nii inimlikke kui ka automaatseid hindamisi nende kahe andmekogumi puhul.', 'fi': 'Nollashot monikielisessä ekstraktiivisessa tekstiyhteenvedossa malli koulutetaan tyypillisesti englanninkieliseen tiivistelmäaineistoon ja sitä sovelletaan sitten muiden kielten tiivistelmäaineistoihin. Kun otetaan huomioon englanninkieliset kultaiset yhteenvedot ja asiakirjat, lausetason etiketit ekstraktiiviselle yhteenvedolle luodaan yleensä heuristiikan avulla. Nämä englanninkielisiin aineistoihin luodut yksikieliset merkinnät eivät kuitenkaan välttämättä ole optimaalisia muiden kielten aineistoissa, sillä eri kielten välillä on syntaktinen tai semanttinen ero. Tällä tavoin on mahdollista kääntää englanninkielinen aineisto muille kielille ja saada erilaisia etikettejä uudelleen heuristiikan avulla. Jotta näiden eri etikettien tiedot voitaisiin hyödyntää täysimääräisesti, ehdotamme NLSsumia (Neural Label Search for Summarization), joka oppii yhdessä näiden eri etikettien hierarkkiset painot tiivistelmämallimme kanssa. Teemme monikielisiä nollakuvauskokeita MLSUM- ja WikiLingua-aineistoilla ja saavutamme huipputason tuloksia käyttämällä sekä inhimillisiä että automaattisia arviointeja näiden kahden aineiston välillä.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Gidaya ƙararin zĩnãriya da takardar Ingiriya, ana samar da alama-daraja wa mai cire-ɗabi'a, ko da ɗabi'a, ana ƙara su a yi amfani da heuristics. However, these monolingual labels created on English datasets may not be optimal on datasets of other languages, for that there is the syntactic or semantic discrepancy between different languages.  @ action: button To, in cika cikakken agana masu haɗi da wannan tsari masu nau'i, muna buƙata NLSSum (Search for Jummari na Label na Neural), wanda ke karanta nau'in hiera masu nau'i wa waɗannan tsaro daban-daban, sami da motel na ƙararinsa. Kana tafiyar jarrabo masu ƙararin-sifiri na'ura cikin mulki-lingui kan MLSUM da WikiLingue, kuma munã sami matsalar-sanar, da amfani da mutane da akan kanana farat ɗaya a cikin wannan set biyu.", 'he': 'במסגרת טקסט מיוציאי רבת-שפות של אפס, דוגמנית אומנת בדרך כלל על קבוצת מידע מיוציאציה אנגלית ואז הופעלה על קבוצת מידע מיוציאציה של שפות אחרות. בהתחשב בסדרות זהב אנגלית ומסמכים, תוויות רמת המשפטים לסדרות חיצונית נוצרות בדרך כלל באמצעות היוריסטיקה. עם זאת, תוויות מונושפות אלה שנוצרות על קבוצות נתונים אנגליות אולי לא אופטימיות על קבוצות נתונים של שפות אחרות, כי יש את ההפרעה הסינטקטית או סמנטית בין שפות שונות. In this way, it is possible to translate the English dataset to other languages and obtain different sets of labels again using heuristics.  כדי להשתמש במלוא במידע של קבוצות שונות של תוויות אלה, אנו מציעים NLSSum (חיפוש של תוויות נוירוליות לסומריזציה), אשר ללמוד יחד משקלים הייררכיים של קבוצות שונות של תוויות אלה יחד עם מודל הסומריזציה שלנו. אנו מבצעים ניסויים רבים של רישום אפס על קופסאות מידע MLSUM ויקילינגווה, ואנחנו משיגים תוצאות חדשות באמצעות הערכות אנושיות ואוטומטיות בשני קופסאות מידע אלה.', 'jv': 'user politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Wurung iki, iso nggunakake dataset Inggris kanggo langgambar gak bener lan ngewehke buturan pangan sing alih Jejaring Awak dhéwé éntuk mulai sistem sing gawe barang nggambar nul-nggambar pertama nggambar data sethaya MLSUM karo WiLingwa, lan kita iso nggawe barang langgar state-of-the-arts gambar deweke sampeyan uwong karo data sethaya iki dadi.', 'bo': 'In zero-shot multilingual extractive text summarization, a model is typically trained on English summarization dataset and then applied on summarization datasets of other languages. Given English gold summaries and documents, sentence-level labels for extractive summarization are usually generated using heuristics. However, these monolingual labels created on English datasets may not be optimal on datasets of other languages, for that there is the syntactic or semantic discrepancy between different languages. In this way, it is possible to translate the English dataset to other languages and obtain different sets of labels again using heuristics. To fully leverage the information of these different sets of labels, we propose NLSSum (Neural Label Search for Summarization), which jointly learns hierarchical weights for these different sets of labels together with our summarization model. We conduct multilingual zero-shot summarization experiments on MLSUM and WikiLingua datasets, and we achieve state-of-the-art results using both human and automatic evaluations across these two datasets.', 'sk': 'Pri večjezičnem ekstraktivnem povzetku besedila brez posnetka se model običajno usposablja za angleški nabor podatkov za povzetek in nato uporablja za nabore podatkov za povzetek drugih jezikov. Glede na angleške zlate povzetke in dokumente se oznake stavkov za ekstraktivno povzetek običajno ustvarijo z uporabo heuristike. Vendar pa te enojezične oznake, ustvarjene na angleških naborih podatkov, morda niso optimalne za nabore podatkov drugih jezikov, zato obstaja sintaktična ali semantična razlika med različnimi jeziki. Na ta način je mogoče angleški nabor podatkov prevesti v druge jezike in ponovno pridobiti različne nabore oznak z uporabo heuristike. Da bi v celoti izkoristili informacije teh različnih sklopov oznak, predlagamo NLSSum (Nevral Label Search for Summarization), ki skupaj uči hierarhične uteži teh različnih sklopov oznak skupaj z našim modelom povzetka. Izvajamo večjezične poskuse ničelnega povzetka na podatkovnih naborih MLSUM in WikiLingua ter dosegamo najsodobnejše rezultate z uporabo človeških in avtomatskih vrednotenj v teh dveh naborih podatkov.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'التعلم التزايدي بفئة قليلة اللقطات للتعرف على الكيان المحدد', 'fr': "Apprentissage incrémentiel en classe en quelques étapes pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées", 'pt': 'Aprendizagem incremental de classe de poucos tiros para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada', 'es': 'Aprendizaje incremental de clases de pocos disparos para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識のための数少ないクラスインクルーメンタルラーニング', 'zh': '名实体识者少镜头类增量学', 'ru': 'Малозадачное классно-кремационное обучение для распознавания именованных сущностей', 'hi': 'नामित एंटिटी पहचान के लिए कुछ-शॉट क्लास-वृद्धिशील सीखना', 'ga': "Rang ar Mhionchur - Foghlaim Incriminteach d'Aithint Aonáin Ainmnithe", 'el': "Λίγη-πυροβολιστική ταξική-κατ' αποκοπή μάθηση για την αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας", 'hu': 'Néhány lövéses osztálynövekvő tanulás a nevezett entitások felismeréséhez', 'ka': 'სახელი ინტერტის განახლებისთვის პატარა კლასის მეტი სწავლება', 'lt': 'Name', 'it': 'Apprendimento incrementale di classe per il riconoscimento di entità nominate', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау үшін кішкентай класс үлкен оқыту', 'mt': 'Few-Shot Class-Incremental Learning for Named Entity Recognition', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Kelas-Incremental-Sedikit Tembak untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള കുറച്ച് ക്ലാസ്- കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Нэр нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition-ын хэмжээний класс-нэмэлт суралцах', 'pl': 'Mało-strzałowe uczenie się przyrostowe klasy dla rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów', 'no': 'Fe-skytt klasse-økande læring for gjenkjenning av namnet entitet', 'ro': 'Învățare incrementală de clasă pentru recunoașterea entităților numite', 'sr': 'Povećavanje klase za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Waxbarashada fasalka-koronta ee aqoonsashada magaca', 'ta': 'பெயரிடப்பட்ட முகவரி அடையாளமுக்கான குறைந்தபட்ச வகுப்பு', 'sv': 'Få-skott klassökning för identifiering av namngivna enheter', 'mk': 'Name', 'ur': 'نام کی اینٹیٹی شناخت کے لئے کم شٹ کلاس-اضافہ کی تعلیم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ít cơ hội học nhóm bùng phát cho người có tên tuổi nhận dạng', 'da': 'Few-Shot Klasse-Incremental Learning for Navngivet Entity Recognition', 'nl': 'Few-Shot Class-Incremental Leren voor Named Entity Recognition', 'bg': 'Малко по-високо обучение в клас за разпознаване на наименовани субекти', 'hr': 'Malo pogođenog učenja klase povećanja priznanja imenovanih podataka', 'de': 'Weniger-Shot Class-Incremental Learning für Named Entity Recognition', 'ko': '명명 실체 식별의 소렌즈류 증량 학습', 'id': 'Beberapa tembakan kelas-Incremental Belajar untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama', 'fa': 'تعلیم افزایش کلاس کمی برای شناسایی عنوان نامیده', 'tr': 'Adlanmış bir taýýarlama üçin az Taýsy Aýratyn Öwrenmek', 'sw': 'Kufundisha Siasa Chache-Shot-Incremental Learning for Recognition Entity Named', 'af': 'Fet- Shot Klas- Incremental Leer vir Gebenaamde Eenheidwerkening', 'sq': 'Mësim i vogël në klasë për njohjen e njësisë së emëruar', 'az': 'Adlı Entity Recognition üçün Qısqa-Shot Klas-Incremental Öyrənmə', 'am': 'Few-Shot Class-Incremental Learning for Named Entity Recognition', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': "Aprendiment incremental de classe amb pocs tirs per a la reconeixement d'entitats anomenades", 'bs': 'Povećavajuće učenje klase za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta', 'cs': 'Několik střel inkrementální učení pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit', 'et': 'Vähese pildi klassi astmeline õpe nimetatud üksuste tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Muutaman laukauksen luokan lisäoppiminen nimettyjen yksiköiden tunnistamista varten', 'jv': 'Few-shot', 'sk': 'Pospešeno učenje razreda za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'למידה מעט-צילומים-מעמד-מגדל לזיהוי איכות בשם', 'bo': 'མིང་དང་བསྐྱར་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་བསླབས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་ཚད་ཕལ་ཆེན་པ'}
{'en': 'We propose fill-in-the-blanks as a video understanding evaluation framework and introduce FIBER – a novel dataset consisting of 28,000 videos and descriptions in support of this evaluation framework. The fill-in-the-blanks setting tests a model’s understanding of a video by requiring it to predict a masked noun phrase in the caption of the video, given the video and the surrounding text. The FIBER benchmark does not share the weaknesses of the current state-of-the-art language-informed video understanding tasks, namely: (1) video question answering using multiple-choice questions, where models perform relatively well because they exploit linguistic biases in the task formulation, thus making our framework challenging for the current state-of-the-art systems to solve; and (2) video captioning, which relies on an open-ended evaluation framework that is often inaccurate because system answers may be perceived as incorrect if they differ in form from the ground truth. The FIBER dataset and our code are available at https://lit.eecs.umich.edu/fiber/.', 'ar': 'يعتمد العمل السابق للتعلم الإضافي للفصل الدراسي للتعرف على الكيان المحدد (NER) على افتراض وجود وفرة من البيانات المصنفة لتدريب الفصول الجديدة. في هذا العمل ، ندرس مشكلة أكثر تحديًا لكنها عملية ، \\ emph {أي} ، التعلم التكميلي للفصل في عدد قليل من اللقطات لـ NER ، حيث يتم تدريب نموذج NER مع عدد قليل فقط من العينات المصنفة من الفصول الجديدة ، دون نسيان معرفة القديمة. للتخفيف من مشكلة النسيان الكارثي في التعلم التدريجي للفصول قليلة اللقطات ، نقوم بإعادة بناء بيانات التدريب التركيبية للفصول القديمة باستخدام نموذج NER المدربين ، مما يزيد من تدريب الفصول الجديدة. نقوم كذلك بتطوير إطار عمل يستخلص من النموذج الحالي مع كل من البيانات التركيبية والبيانات الحقيقية من مجموعة التدريب الحالية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا يحقق تحسينات كبيرة على خطوط الأساس الحالية.', 'es': 'El trabajo anterior de aprendizaje incremental en clase para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) se basa en la suposición de que existe una gran cantidad de datos etiquetados para la capacitación de nuevas clases. En este trabajo, estudiamos un problema más desafiante pero práctico,\\ emph {i.e.}, el aprendizaje incremental de clases de pocas etapas para NER, donde se entrena un modelo de NER con solo unas pocas muestras etiquetadas de las nuevas clases, sin olvidar el conocimiento de las antiguas. Para aliviar el problema del olvido catastrófico en el aprendizaje incremental de clase de pocos pasos, reconstruimos los datos de entrenamiento sintéticos de las clases antiguas utilizando el modelo NER entrenado, aumentando la capacitación de las nuevas clases. Desarrollamos aún más un marco que se basa en el modelo existente con datos sintéticos y datos reales del conjunto de entrenamiento actual. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro enfoque logra mejoras significativas con respecto a las líneas de base existentes.', 'fr': "Les travaux antérieurs d'apprentissage incrémentiel en classe pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) reposent sur l'hypothèse qu'il existe une abondance de données étiquetées pour la formation de nouvelles classes. Dans ce travail, nous étudions un problème plus difficile mais plus pratique,\xa0\\ emph {c.-à-d.}, l'apprentissage incrémentiel en classe pour NER, où un modèle NER est entraîné avec seulement quelques échantillons étiquetés des nouvelles classes, sans oublier la connaissance des anciennes classes. Pour atténuer le problème de l'oubli catastrophique dans l'apprentissage incrémentiel en quelques étapes, nous reconstruisons les données d'entraînement synthétiques des anciennes classes à l'aide du modèle NER entraîné, augmentant ainsi la formation des nouvelles classes. Nous développons également un cadre qui distille à partir du modèle existant à la fois des données synthétiques et des données réelles provenant de l'ensemble d'entraînement actuel. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre approche permet d'obtenir des améliorations significatives par rapport aux niveaux de référence existants.", 'pt': 'Trabalhos anteriores de aprendizado incremental de classe para Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada (NER) baseiam-se na suposição de que existe abundância de dados rotulados para o treinamento de novas classes. Neste trabalho, estudamos um problema mais desafiador, mas prático, \\emph{i.e.}, aprendizado incremental de classe de poucos tiros para NER, onde um modelo de NER é treinado com apenas algumas amostras rotuladas das novas classes, sem esquecer o conhecimento do velhos. Para aliviar o problema do esquecimento catastrófico no aprendizado incremental de classe de poucos tiros, reconstruímos dados sintéticos de treinamento das classes antigas usando o modelo NER treinado, aumentando o treinamento de novas classes. Desenvolvemos ainda uma estrutura que destila do modelo existente com dados sintéticos e dados reais do conjunto de treinamento atual. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nossa abordagem alcança melhorias significativas em relação às linhas de base existentes.', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）のためのクラス増加学習の以前の研究は、新しいクラスのトレーニングのためのラベル付けされたデータが豊富に存在するという仮定に依存している。この研究では、NERモデルが古いクラスの知識を忘れることなく、新しいクラスのラベル付きサンプルのみでトレーニングされる、NERのための数少ないクラス増大型学習という、より困難でありながら実用的な問題を研究します。少人数授業での壊滅的な忘れの問題を緩和するために、訓練されたNERモデルを使用して古い授業の合成訓練データを再構築し、新しい授業の訓練を強化します。さらに、既存のモデルから合成データと現行のトレーニングセットからの実データの両方を抽出するフレームワークを開発します。実験結果は、当社のアプローチが既存のベースラインを大幅に改善することを示しています。', 'zh': '前名实体识 (NER) 之类增量学事赖以下假设:多于训练新类标数。 于此之事,究一更具挑战性而益实,NER少类增量学,NER以新类数表样本教之,不忘旧类也。 缓于少镜头类增量学灾难性遗忘,吾以练NER重建旧类合为训练数据,以增新类之教。 更开一框架,当框架从现在模提炼出合成数,及自练集之实。 实验结果表明,比于今基线,吾道显改。', 'hi': 'नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) के लिए क्लास-इंक्रीमेंटल लर्निंग का पिछला काम इस धारणा पर निर्भर करता है कि नई कक्षाओं के प्रशिक्षण के लिए लेबल किए गए डेटा की बहुतायत मौजूद है। इस काम में, हम एक अधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण लेकिन व्यावहारिक समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं, \\emph{यानी}, एनईआर के लिए कुछ-शॉट क्लास-वृद्धिशील सीखने, जहां एक एनईआर मॉडल को नए वर्गों के केवल कुछ लेबल वाले नमूनों के साथ प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, पुराने लोगों के ज्ञान को भूलने के बिना। कुछ-शॉट वर्ग-वृद्धिशील सीखने में विनाशकारी भूलने की समस्या को कम करने के लिए, हम प्रशिक्षित एनईआर मॉडल का उपयोग करके पुरानी कक्षाओं के सिंथेटिक प्रशिक्षण डेटा का पुनर्निर्माण करते हैं, नई कक्षाओं के प्रशिक्षण को बढ़ाते हैं। हम आगे एक रूपरेखा विकसित करते हैं जो सिंथेटिक डेटा, और वर्तमान प्रशिक्षण सेट से वास्तविक डेटा दोनों के साथ मौजूदा मॉडल से डिस्टिल करता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण मौजूदा बेसलाइन पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Предыдущая работа по классному обучению для распознавания именованных сущностей (NER) основывается на предположении, что существует обилие маркированных данных для обучения новых классов. В этой работе мы изучаем более сложную, но практическую проблему, \\emph{т.е.}, малоурочное классно-постепенное обучение для NER, где модель NER обучается только с несколькими помеченными образцами новых классов, не забывая о знаниях старых. Чтобы облегчить проблему катастрофического забывания в  малоурочном класс-постепенном обучении, реконструируем синтетические данные обучения старых классов с использованием обученной модели NER, дополняя обучение новых классов. Мы далее разрабатываем структуру, которая отталкивается от существующей модели как с синтетическими данными, так и реальными данными из текущего обучающего набора. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход значительно улучшается по сравнению с существующими базовыми линиями.', 'ga': 'Braitheann obair ranga roimhe seo ar fhoghlaim incriminteach le haghaidh Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) ar an mbonn tuisceana go bhfuil flúirse sonraí lipéadaithe ann chun ranganna nua a oiliúint. Sa saothar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar fhadhb atá níos dúshlánaí ach níos praiticiúla, \\emph{i.e.}, foghlaim incriminteach ranga cúpla-shot do NER, áit a gcuirtear oiliúint ar mhúnla NER gan ach beagán samplaí lipéadaithe de na ranganna nua, gan dearmad a dhéanamh ar eolas ar na ranganna nua. sean. Chun fadhb na dearmad tubaisteach a mhaolú i bhfoghlaim incriminteach ranga cúpla lámhaigh, déanaimid sonraí oiliúna sintéiseacha na sean-ranganna a athchruthú ag baint úsáide as an tsamhail NER oilte, ag cur leis an oiliúint do ranganna nua. Déanaimid tuilleadh forbartha ar chreat a dhriogadh ón múnla atá ann faoi láthair le sonraí sintéiseacha, agus fíorshonraí ón tsraith oiliúna reatha. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil feabhsuithe suntasacha á mbaint amach ag ár gcur chuige thar na bunlínte reatha.', 'ka': 'სახელი ინტერტიტის განახლებისთვის კლასის კრემონემენტიური სწავლების წინ მუშაობა, რომ ახალი კლასის განახლებისთვის მარტივი მონაცემები არსებობს. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ უფრო შესაძლებელია, მაგრამ პრაქტიკური პრობლემა, \\emph{i.e.}, რამდენიმე შესაძლებელი კლასი-კრემონტემინტიული „NER-ის სწავლობა”, სადაც NER მოდელის მოწყობინება ახალი კლასის მხოლოდ რამდე კატატროფიკას პრობლემას გახსნა, რომელიც დავიბრუნეთ ცოტა კლასის კრემონემენტური სწავლებაში, ჩვენ შევსრულებთ სინტეტიკური სწავლების მონაცემები ძველი კლასის გამოყენებული NER მოდელს, ახალი კლა ჩვენ მეტი განვითარებით ფრამეტრი, რომელიც არსებობს მოდელიდან სინტეტიკური მონაცემებით და რეალური მონაცემებით მიმდინარე განვითარებით. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენების შემდეგ.', 'hu': 'A Nevezett Entity Recognition (NER) osztály-fokozatos tanulásának korábbi munkája azon a feltételezésen alapul, hogy az új osztályok képzéséhez rengeteg címkézett adat áll rendelkezésre. Ebben a munkában egy nagyobb kihívást jelentő, de gyakorlati problémát tanulmányozunk, \\emph{azaz} néhány lövéses osztály-inkrementális tanulást a NER számára, ahol egy NER modellt képeznek csak néhány címkézett mintával az új osztályokból, anélkül, hogy megfeledkeznénk a régiekről. A katasztrofális felejtés problémájának enyhítése érdekében a néhány lövéses osztály-inkrementális tanulás során a régi osztályok szintetikus képzési adatait a képzett NER modell segítségével rekonstruáljuk, növelve az új osztályok képzését. Továbbfejlesztünk egy olyan keretet, amely a meglévő modellből lepárlódik mind a szintetikus adatokkal, mind a jelenlegi képzési készletből származó valós adatokkal. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk jelentős javulást ér el a meglévő alapkövetekhez képest.', 'el': 'Η προηγούμενη εργασία της τάξης-αυξητικής μάθησης για την αναγνώριση ονομαστών οντοτήτων βασίζεται στην υπόθεση ότι υπάρχει αφθονία επισημασμένων δεδομένων για την εκπαίδευση νέων τάξεων. Στην εργασία αυτή μελετάμε ένα πιο δύσκολο αλλά πρακτικό πρόβλημα, \\όπου ένα μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται με λίγα μόνο μαρκαρισμένα δείγματα των νέων τάξεων, χωρίς να ξεχνάμε τις γνώσεις των παλαιών. Για να αμβλυνθεί το πρόβλημα της καταστροφικής λησμονής στην βαθμιαία μάθηση, ανασυγκροτούν συνθετικά δεδομένα κατάρτισης των παλαιών τάξεων χρησιμοποιώντας το εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο ενισχύοντας την εκπαίδευση νέων τάξεων. Αναπτύσσουμε περαιτέρω ένα πλαίσιο που αποσταλεί από το υπάρχον μοντέλο τόσο με συνθετικά δεδομένα όσο και με πραγματικά δεδομένα από το τρέχον εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τις υπάρχουσες γραμμές βάσης.', 'it': "Il precedente lavoro di apprendimento incrementale di classe per il riconoscimento di entità nominate (NER) si basa sul presupposto che esista abbondanza di dati etichettati per la formazione di nuove classi. In questo lavoro, studiamo un problema più impegnativo ma pratico, \\emph{i.e.}, l'apprendimento incrementale di classe pochi colpi per NER, dove un modello NER viene addestrato con pochi campioni etichettati delle nuove classi, senza dimenticare la conoscenza di quelle vecchie. Per alleviare il problema dell'oblio catastrofico nell'apprendimento incrementale di classe pochi colpi, ricostruiamo i dati di allenamento sintetici delle vecchie classi utilizzando il modello NER addestrato, aumentando la formazione di nuove classi. Sviluppiamo ulteriormente un framework che distilla dal modello esistente con dati sintetici e dati reali dal set di formazione corrente. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro approccio apporta miglioramenti significativi rispetto alle linee di base esistenti.", 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) үшін класс жұмысының алдыңғы жұмысы, жаңа класс оқыту үшін жарлық деректері бар деп ойлайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз көп жақын, бірақ практикалық мәселеді зерттейміз, \\emph{i.e.}, NER үшін бірнеше шарт класының оқытуы, жерде NER үлгісі жаңа класының тек бірнеше үлгілерімен оқыту үшін, ескі класының білімін ұмы Қатастрофиялық ұмытылу мәселесін көшірмелеу үшін, біз ескі сыныптардың синтетикалық оқыту деректерін NER моделін қолдану үшін, жаңа сыныптарды оқыту үшін қайта құрамыз. Біз қолданыстағы моделден синтетикалық деректер мен назардағы оқыту бағдарламасынан шын деректерді бөліп кеткен фреймді жасаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің тәсіліміздің барлық негізгі жолдарда көп жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kerja sebelumnya pembelajaran-tambahan kelas untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama (NER) bergantung pada asumsi bahawa terdapat banyak data yang ditabel untuk latihan kelas baru. In this work, we study a more challenging but practical problem, \\emph{i.e.}, few-shot class-incremental  learning for NER, where an NER model is trained with only few labeled samples of the new classes, without forgetting knowledge of the old ones.  Untuk mengurangi masalah melupakan bencana dalam pembelajaran kelas-incremental beberapa tembakan, kami membina semula data latihan sintetik kelas lama menggunakan model NER terlatih, meningkatkan latihan kelas baru. Kami mengembangkan kerangka yang membentuk dari model yang wujud dengan kedua-dua data sintetik, dan data sebenar dari set latihan semasa. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas garis dasar yang wujud.', 'mk': 'Претходната работа на учење по класа за препознавање на именувани ентитети (NER) се потпира на претпоставката дека постои доволно обележани податоци за обука на нови класи. Во оваа работа, ние студираме поголем предизвик, но практичен проблем, \\emph{i.e.}, неколку снимки клас-incremental “ учење за НЕР, каде моделот НЕР е трениран со само неколку етикетирани примероци од новите класи, без да заборавиме на знаењето за старите. За да го олесниме проблемот на катастрофалното заборавување во неколку куршуми, реконструираме синтетички податоци за обука на старите класи користејќи го обучениот НЕР модел, зголемувајќи го обуката на новите класи. Понатаму развиваме рамка која се дистилира од постојниот модел со синтетички податоци, како и вистински податоци од сегашниот набор обуки. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап постигнува значителни подобрувања во однос на постојните бази.', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള മുമ്പുള്ള ക്ലാസിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്സിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപുള്ള പഠിക്കുന്ന പണിയില്\u200d പുതിയ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രശ്നം പഠിക്കുന്നു, പക്ഷെ പ്രാകൃതിക പ്രശ്നമായ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d, \\എംമ്}, കുറച്ച് വെടിവെക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്ലാസ കുറച്ച് വെടിയുള്ള ക്ലാസില്\u200d മറന്നുപോകുന്ന കഷ്ട്രോഫിക്കിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം ലഘോഷിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, പഴയ ക്ലാസിലെ പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പുത നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുവെക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d നാം വികസിക്കുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള പരിശ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നിലവിലുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രാധാന്യം വളരെ മ', 'mt': 'Xogħol preċedenti ta’ tagħlim inkrementali tal-klassi għar-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER) jiddependi fuq is-suppożizzjoni li jeżisti abbundanza ta’ dejta ttikkettata għat-taħriġ ta’ klassijiet ġodda. F’dan ix-xogħol, nistudjaw problem a aktar sfidanti i żda prattika, \\emph{i.e.}, tagħlim inkrementali tal-klassi b’ftit skopijiet għan-NER, fejn mudell NER huwa mħarreġ b’ftit biss kampjuni ttikkettati tal-klassijiet il-ġodda, mingħajr ma ninsew l-għarfien ta’ dawk l-antiki. Biex itaffu l-problema ta’ tinsa katastrofika fit-tagħlim inkrementali tal-klassi b’ftit skopijiet, nirrikostruwixxu dejta ta’ taħriġ sintetiku tal-klassijiet l-qodma bl-użu tal-mudell NER imħarreġ, u nżidu t-taħriġ ta’ klassijiet ġodda. Aħna niżviluppaw aktar qafas li jiddistilla mill-mudell eżistenti kemm b’dejta sintetika, kif ukoll b’dejta reali mis-sett ta’ taħriġ attwali. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jikseb titjib sinifikanti fuq il-linji bażi eżistenti.', 'pl': 'Dotychczasowa praca nauki przyrostowej klasy dla rozpoznawania nazwanych jednostek (NER) opiera się na założeniu, że istnieje obfitość oznakowanych danych do treningu nowych zajęć. W niniejszej pracy badamy bardziej wymagający, lecz praktyczny problem, \\emph{tj.}, kilka zajęć klasowo-przyrostową naukę dla NER, gdzie model NER jest trenowany tylko z kilkoma oznaczonymi próbkami nowych klas, nie zapominając o znajomości starych. Aby złagodzić problem katastrofalnego zapomnienia w uczeniu się przyrostowym kilkunastu klas, rekonstruujemy syntetyczne dane treningowe starych klas za pomocą przeszkolonego modelu NER, wzmacniając szkolenie nowych klas. Dalej opracowujemy ramy, które destylują z istniejącego modelu zarówno z danymi syntetycznymi, jak i rzeczywistymi danymi z obecnego zestawu szkoleń. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście osiąga znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do istniejących linii bazowych.', 'ro': 'Lucrările anterioare de învățare incrementală în clasă pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) se bazează pe presupunerea că există abundență de date etichetate pentru formarea noilor clase. În această lucrare, studiem o problemă mai dificilă, dar practică, \\emph{i.e}, învățarea incrementală a clasei cu câteva lovituri pentru NER, unde un model NER este instruit cu doar câteva mostre etichetate din noile clase, fără a uita cunoașterea celor vechi. Pentru a atenua problema uitării catastrofale în învățarea incrementală a claselor cu câteva împușcături, reconstruim datele sintetice de formare ale claselor vechi folosind modelul NER instruit, sporind formarea noilor clase. Dezvoltăm în continuare un cadru care distilează din modelul existent atât cu date sintetice, cât și date reale din setul actual de formare. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea noastră obține îmbunătățiri semnificative față de liniile de bază existente.', 'lt': 'Ankstesnis vardinio subjekto pripažinimo (NER) klasės papildomo mokymosi darbas grindžiamas prielaida, kad yra daug pažymėtų duomenų naujoms klasėms mokymui. Šiame darbe mes tiriame sudėtingesnę, bet praktinę problem ą, t. y.}, nedidelį klasės papildomą mokymąsi NER, kur NER model is mokomas tik su keliais pažymėtais naujų klasių pavyzdžiais, nepamirštant senųjų žinių. Siekiant sušvelninti katastrofinio pamiršimo problem ą, kai mokymasis yra nedidelis, mes atkuriame senųjų klasių sintetinius mokymo duomenis naudojant apmokytą NER model į, didinant naujų klasių mokymą. Toliau plėtojame sistemą, kuri distiliuoja esamą model į su sintetiniais duomenimis ir realiais dabartinio mokymo rinkinio duomenimis. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris gerokai pagerina esamas bazines vertes.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хичээлийн сургалтын өмнөх хичээл дээр нэрлэгдсэн Объектын Recognition (NER) суралцах нь шинэ хичээлийн сургалтын хэмжээний нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн тоо байдаг гэдэгт итгэдэг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид илүү хэцүү, гэхдээ практикийн асуудлыг судлах болно. Гайхамшигтай асуудлыг багасгахын тулд хэд хэдэн хичээл нэмэгдүүлэх сургалтын тулд бид хуучин хичээлийн синтетик сургалтын өгөгдлийг NER загварыг ашиглаж, шинэ хичээлийн сургалтыг нэмэгдүүлж, Бид одоогийн сургалтын загвараас хоёр синтетик өгөгдлийг, жинхэнэ өгөгдлийг орчин сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын хоорондоо ялгаатай бүтээгдэхүүн үүсгэдэг. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга хэмжээний суурь шугам дээр маш чухал сайжруулалт гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'so': 'Shaqadii hore ee la baranayo aqoonsashada ganacsiga (NER) waxay ku xiran tahay malaynta inay jiraan macluumaad badan oo la xiriiray waxbarashada fasalka cusub. Shaqadan, waxaynu wax ku baranaynaa dhibaato ka qallafsan laakiin caadiga ah, tusaale {i.e.}, barashada fasalka wax yar oo la kordhay NER, meesha lagu baranayo model NER oo lagu baranayo tusaalooyin yar oo la saxeeyey fasalka cusub, halmaamayna aqoonta odayaasha. Si aannu u fududayno dhibaatada xasaradaha halmaanka waxbarashada fasalka aad u saxday, waxaynu u cusboonaynaa macluumaadka waxbarashada bandhigyada ee fasalka hore oo isticmaalaya modelka NER-tababarida, waxaana kordhinaa waxbarashada fasalka cusub. Waxaynu korinaynaa frame, kaasoo ka duwan qaababka joogta ah oo ku qoran labada macluumaad, iyo macluumaad dhab ah oo ka yimaada kooxda waxbarashada joogta. Abaalka imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu helo hagaajin aad u weyn oo ka sii kordhaya saldhigyada joogta.', 'sv': 'Tidigare arbete med klassinkrementellt lärande för Named Entity Recognition (NER) bygger på antagandet att det finns överflöd av märkta data för utbildning av nya klasser. I detta arbete studerar vi ett mer utmanande men praktiskt problem, \\emph{d.e.}, ett fåtal-skott klassinkrementellt lärande för NER, där en NER modell tränas med endast få märkta prover av de nya klasserna, utan att glömma kunskap om de gamla. För att lindra problemet med katastrofal glömska i enkelskotts klassinkrementellt lärande rekonstruerar vi syntetiska träningsdata från de gamla klasserna med hjälp av den utbildade NER-modellen, vilket ökar utbildningen av nya klasser. Vi utvecklar vidare ett ramverk som destillerar från den befintliga modellen med både syntetiska data och verkliga data från den aktuella träningsuppsättningen. Experimentella resultat visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med befintliga baslinjer.', 'sr': 'Prethodni rad klasnog incrementalnog učenja za priznanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) oslanja se na pretpostavku da postoji dosta označenih podataka za obuku novih klasa. U ovom poslu, proučavamo izazovniji ali praktičniji problem, \\emph{i.e.}, nekoliko snimanja klase incrementalnog učenja za NER, gde je model NER obučen sa samo nekoliko označenih uzorka novih klasa, bez zaboravljanja znanja starih. Da bismo olakšali problem katastrofijskog zaboravljanja u nekoliko stupnjeva klasnog incrementalnog učenja, rekonstruisali smo sintetičke podatke o starim časovima koristeći obučeni model NER, povećavajući obuku novih časova. Dalje razvijamo okvir koji razlikuje od postojećeg model a i sintetičkim podacima i pravim podacima od trenutnog seta obuke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postiže značajno poboljšanje na postojećim osnovnim linijama.', 'si': 'Name මේ වැඩේ අපි තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, \\emph{i.e.}, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, NER වෙනුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න, NE අමතක වෙලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අමතක වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, අපි පරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, පරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරය අපි තවදුරටත් විස්තර කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ මොඩල් එකෙන් විස්තර කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ සංවිධානයේ දත් පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශාල', 'no': 'Førre arbeid på klasseøkende læring for namnet entitetskjenning (NER) er avhengig av assumpsjonen at det finst mange merkelige data for opplæring av nye klassar. I denne arbeida studerer vi eit meir vanskeleg, men praktisk problem, \\emph{i.e.}, få-shot klasse-incremental ’læring for NER, der ein NER-modell vert trent med berre få merkelige prøver av dei nye klassene, utan å glemme kunnskap av dei gamle. For å redusere problemet med katastrofisk å glemme i få-shot klasseøkende læring, bygger vi rekonstrurer syntetiske opplæringsdata av gamle klassene med den trengte NER-modellen, og øker opplæring av nye klassene. Vi utviklar framover eit rammeverk som distiller frå den eksisterande modellen med både syntetiske data og verkelege data frå den gjeldande opplæringssettet. Eksperimentale resultat viser at tilnærminga vårt gjer signifikante forbedringar over eksisterande baselinjer.', 'ur': 'نام رکھی Entity Recognition (NER) کے لئے کلاس کے اضافہ کی تعلیم کا پہلے کام اس حدس پر ہے کہ نو کلاس کی تعلیم کے لئے لابل کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم اس کام میں زیادہ مشکل پڑھتے ہیں لیکن عمدہ مشکل کی پڑھتے ہیں، \\emph{i.e.}, کم-shot کلاس-incremental ،NER کے لئے سکھاتے ہیں، جہاں ایک NER مدل صرف بہت کم نئی کلاس کے نمونے کے ساتھ آموزش کی جاتی ہے، بغیر بوڑھے لوگوں کے علم کو بھول جاتے ہیں. بہت کم شیٹ کلاس اضافہ کی تعلیم میں بھول جانے کی مسئلہ کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے، ہم پہلے کلاس کی سینٹیٹیکی تعلیم دیٹے کو استعمال کی NER موڈل کے مطابق دوبارہ ساخت کرتے ہیں، نو کلاس کی تعلیم کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم اس سے زیادہ ایک فرمود ایجاد کریں جو موجود موڈل سے سینٹیسی ڈیٹے اور موجود ترینس سٹ سے حقیقی ڈیٹے سے جدا کرتا ہے۔ Experimental results show that our approach achieves significant improvements over existing baselines.', 'ta': 'பெயரிடப்பட்ட பெயர் அடையாளம் (NER) க்கான முந்தைய வகுப்பு படிப்பு கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் பணி புதிய வகுப்பு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு மிகவும் சவாலிக்கும் ஆனால் செயல்பாடு பிரச்சினையை படிக்கிறோம் \\emph {i.e.} , சில சுட்டிக்கப்பட்ட வகுப்பு அதிகரிப்பு கற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம் , அங சில சுட்ட வகுப்பு கல்வியில் மறந்து விடுவதின் பிரச்சினையை எளிதாக்க, நாம் பழைய வகுப்புகளின் கூட்டத்திற்கு பயிற்சி NER மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி பழைய பய நாம் மேலும் ஒரு சட்டத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அது நடப்பு பயிற்சி அமைப்பிலிருந்து இருந்து உள்ள மாதிரியிலிருந்து  முயற்சி முடிவு', 'uz': "Name Bu vazifanda biz bir qanchalik qiziqarli muammolarni o'rganamiz, masalan, \\m.}, bir nechta ko'p sinf o'rganishni o'rganamiz, bu yerda NER model i faqat yangi sinfning bir necha ko'plab o'rganish misollari bilan o'rganadi, balki oldingi sinflari haqida o'rganish mumkin. Ko'pchilik darajadagi o'rganishni o'zgartirish muammolarni kamaytirish uchun, biz yangi sinfning o'rganishni qaytadan foydalanishimiz, yangi sinfning o'rganishni o'rganishni qaytadi. Biz mavjud modeldan bir qatlam yaratishimiz va joriy taʼminlovchi soʻzdan rasm maʼlumot bilan ajratiladi. Experimental results show that our approach achieves significant improvements over existing baselines.", 'vi': 'Việc làm trước kia của lớp học tăng dần cho Người Tênd Entity recognition (NER) dựa trên giả thuyết rằng có rất nhiều dữ liệu được dán nhãn để đào tạo các lớp mới. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu một vấn đề thách thức hơn nhưng thực tế, \\ emph (v.e., các loại) vài phát vào lớp học cuộc tăng cường dành cho cái máy, nơi một cái máy nằm trong đó được huấn luyện chỉ với vài mẫu được dán nhãn của lớp mới, mà không quên được kiến thức của lớp cũ. Để giải quyết vấn đề bị lãng quên thảm họa trong việc học lớp học số ít, chúng tôi tái tạo dữ liệu giáo dục tổng hợp của các lớp cũ bằng cách sử dụng người máy đã được huấn luyện, cải tiến việc đào tạo lớp mới. Chúng tôi còn phát triển một cơ sở để chưng cất từ mô hình đã có, với cả dữ liệu nhân tạo lẫn dữ liệu thực từ bộ huấn luyện hiện tại. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được những cải tiến đáng kể.', 'nl': 'Eerder werk van class-incremental learning voor Named Entity Recognition (NER) berust op de veronderstelling dat er een overvloed aan gelabelde gegevens voor het trainen van nieuwe klassen bestaat. In dit werk bestuderen we een meer uitdagend maar praktisch probleem, \\emph{d.w.z.}, few-shot class-incrementeel leren voor NER, waarbij een NER model wordt getraind met slechts enkele gelabelde voorbeelden van de nieuwe klassen, zonder de kennis van de oude te vergeten. Om het probleem van het catastrofale vergeten bij het incrementele leren van weinig schot te verlichten, reconstrueren we synthetische trainingsgegevens van de oude klassen met behulp van het getrainde NER-model, waardoor de training van nieuwe klassen wordt uitgebreid. We ontwikkelen een framework dat distilleert van het bestaande model met zowel synthetische data als echte data uit de huidige trainingsset. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak aanzienlijke verbeteringen bereikt ten opzichte van bestaande baselines.', 'bg': 'Предишната работа по успоредно обучение за разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НЕР) разчита на предположението, че има изобилие от етикетирани данни за обучението на нови класове. В тази работа изучаваме един по-предизвикателен, но практически проблем, \\емх{т.е.}, малко-курсово-степенно обучение за НЕР, където се обучава модел с само няколко маркирани образци от новите класове, без да забравяме познанията за старите. За да облекчим проблема с катастрофалното забравяне при неколкократно обучение, реконструираме синтетичните данни за обучението на старите класове, използвайки тренирания модел, увеличавайки обучението на нови класове. Разработваме рамка, която извлича от съществуващия модел както синтетични данни, така и реални данни от текущия набор от обучения. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход постига значителни подобрения спрямо съществуващите базови линии.', 'da': 'Tidligere arbejde med klasse-inkrementel læring for Navngivet Entity Recognition (NER) bygger på den antagelse, at der findes overflod af mærkede data til uddannelse af nye klasser. I dette arbejde studerer vi et mere udfordrende, men praktisk problem, \\emph{dvs}, få-skud klasse-inkrementel læring for NER, hvor en NER model trænes med kun få mærkede prøver af de nye klasser, uden at glemme kendskabet til de gamle. For at afhjælpe problemet med katastrofal glemmelse i få skud klasse-inkrementel læring rekonstruerer vi syntetiske træningsdata fra de gamle klasser ved hjælp af den trænede NER model og øger træningen af nye klasser. Vi udvikler yderligere en ramme, der destillerer fra den eksisterende model med både syntetiske data og reelle data fra det nuværende træningssæt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til eksisterende basislinjer.', 'hr': 'Prethodni rad klase incrementalnog učenja za priznanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) oslanja se na pretpostavku da postoji dosta označenih podataka za obuku novih klasa. U ovom poslu, proučavamo izazovniji ali praktičniji problem, \\emph{i.e.}, nekoliko snimanja klase incrementalnog učenja za NER, gdje je model NER obučen sa samo nekoliko označenih uzorka novih klasa, bez zaboravljanja znanja starih. Da bismo olakšali problem katastrofičkog zaboravljanja u nekoliko stupnjevnih incrementalnih učenja, rekonstruirali smo sintetičke podatke o vježbama starih razreda koristeći obučeni model NER-a, povećavajući obuku novih razreda. Dalje razvijamo okvir koji razlikuje od postojećeg model a i sintetičkim podacima, i pravim podacima od trenutnog seta obuke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postigne značajne poboljšanje na postojećim osnovnim linijama.', 'de': 'Bisherige Arbeiten des klasseninkrementellen Lernens für Named Entity Recognition (NER) beruhen auf der Annahme, dass es eine Fülle von markierten Daten für das Training neuer Klassen gibt. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir ein anspruchsvolleres, aber praktischeres Problem, \\emph{i.e.}, das "few-shot class-incremental learning" für NER, bei dem ein NER-Modell mit nur wenigen markierten Beispielen der neuen Klassen trainiert wird, ohne dabei Kenntnisse der alten zu vergessen. Um das Problem des katastrophalen Vergessens beim inkrementellen Lernen zu lindern, rekonstruieren wir synthetische Trainingsdaten der alten Klassen mithilfe des trainierten NER-Modells und erweitern das Training neuer Klassen. Wir entwickeln ein Framework weiter, das aus dem bestehenden Modell sowohl synthetische Daten als auch reale Daten aus dem aktuellen Trainingsset destilliert. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber bestehenden Baselines erzielt.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan sebelumnya pembelajaran incremental kelas untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama (NER) bergantung pada asumsi bahwa ada banyak data yang ditabel untuk pelatihan kelas baru. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempelajari masalah yang lebih menantang tapi praktis, \\emph{i.e.}, beberapa tembakan kelas-incremental belajar untuk NER, di mana model NER dilatih dengan hanya beberapa sampel yang ditabel kelas baru, tanpa melupakan pengetahuan tentang kelas lama. Untuk mengurangi masalah melupakan bencana dalam beberapa penembakan kelas-incremental belajar, kami membangun kembali data pelatihan sintetis kelas lama menggunakan model NER terlatih, meningkatkan pelatihan kelas baru. Kami mengembangkan lebih lanjut sebuah rangkaian yang membentuk model yang ada dengan data sintetis, dan data nyata dari set latihan saat ini. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas garis dasar yang ada.', 'ko': '기존의 명칭 실체 식별(NER) 클래스의 증량 학습 작업은 모두 이러한 가설을 바탕으로 한다. 즉, 새로운 클래스를 훈련하는 데 대량의 표기 데이터가 존재한다는 것이다.이 작업에서 우리는 더욱 도전적이지만 실제적인 문제를 연구했다. 즉, NER의 소렌즈류 증량 학습이다. 그 중에서 NER모델은 새로운 종류의 소량 표기 견본만 사용하여 훈련을 하고 구류의 지식을 잊지 않는다.작은 렌즈류의 증량 학습 중의 재난적 망각 문제를 완화하기 위해 우리는 훈련된 NER 모델을 이용하여 구류의 합성 훈련 데이터를 재구성하고 새로운 종류의 훈련을 증가시켰다.우리는 기존 모델에서 합성 데이터와 현재 훈련 집합의 실제 데이터를 추출하는 구조를 한층 더 개발했다.실험 결과는 기존의 기선에 비해 우리의 방법이 현저한 개선을 얻었다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya zamani ya kujifunza kwa ajili ya Kutambua Ujumbe wa Jinai (NER) inategemea dhana kwamba kuna taarifa nyingi za maarufu kwa ajili ya mafunzo ya darasa mpya. Katika kazi hii, tunasoma changamoto zaidi lakini tatizo la kihalisi, \\emph {i.}, kujifunza kwa darasa chache zilizopigwa risasi kwa ajili ya NER, ambapo model ya NER inafundishwa na mifano michache tu yenye maarufu ya darasa mpya, bila kusahau maarifa ya wazee. To alleviate the problem of catastrophic forgetting in  few-shot class-incremental learning, we reconstruct synthetic training data of the old classes using the trained NER model, augmenting the training of new classes.  Tunaendeleza mfumo unaofautiana na muundo uliopo na takwimu za pamoja, na taarifa halisi kutoka kwenye seti ya mafunzo ya sasa. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu inapata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya misingi yanayopo.', 'tr': 'Adlann Entity Recognition (NER) üçin öňki synp inkremental öwrenmesiniň üstündeki işi täze synplar öwrenmesi üçin birnäçe sany bar diýip pikir edýär. Bu i şde biz biraz kynçylyk ýöne praktik mesele öwrenýärik, \\emph{i.e.}, NER üçin azajyk synp-inkremental  öwrenmek üçin, ol ýerde NER modeli täze synplaryň diňe birnäçe sanlary bilen täze sanlaryň nusgalaryny ýatdan çykarmadan öwrenýär. Katastrofiýanyň ýatdan çykyp bilen ýatdan çykanlaryň meselelerini azaltmak üçin, köne synplaryň syntetik bilim maglumatyny NER modelini ulanyp, täze synplaryň eğimini artýardyk. Biz hem bar modelden hem sintetik maglumatlar bilen we hem hakyky maglumatlary häzirki okuwçylardan tapawutlayan bir çerçew düzenledik. Aramanyň netijeleri bolan ýagdaýymyzyň bar baz hatlaryň üstünde möhüm gelişmeleri ýetişdirýär.', 'af': "Vorige werk van klas-inkremensiele leer vir genoem Entiteit-herkening (NER) belangrik op die aanvaar dat daar bestaan oorvloedigheid van gemerkte data vir die onderwerp van nuwe klasse. In hierdie werk studeer ons 'n meer praktiese, maar praktiese probleem, \\emph{i.e.}, paar-skoot klas-incremental “ leer vir NER, waar 'n NER model is opgelei met slegs paar etiketeerde voorbeelde van die nuwe klasse, sonder vergeet kennis van die ou klasse. Om die probleem van katastrofiese vergeet in 'n paar-skoot klas-incrementale leer te alleen, rekonstruktuer ons sintetiese onderwerking data van die ou klasse met die gebruik van die onderwerpende NER model, en die onderwerp van nuwe klasse vergroot. Ons ontwikkel verder 'n raamwerk wat verskil van die bestaande model met beide sintetiese data en regte data van die huidige opvoeringsstel. Eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons toegang betekende verbeteringe oor bestaande basis lyne bereik.", 'fa': 'کارهای قبلی از یادگیری با تحصیل کلاس برای شناسایی اجتماعی نامیده شده (NER) بر فرض است که بسیاری از اطلاعات برچسب برای آموزش کلاس جدید وجود دارد. در این کار، ما یک مشکل مشکل سخت\u200cتر اما عملی\u200cتر را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم، \\emph{i.e.}، تعلیم کلاس\u200cهای کمی بیشتر برای NER، جایی که یک مدل NER با فقط چند نمونه\u200cهای نقاشی از کلاس\u200cهای جدید آموزش می\u200cشود، بدون فراموش کردن دانش قدیمی\u200cها. برای آسانی کردن مشکل ناراحتی که در یادگیری چند کلاس افزایش را فراموش کرده\u200cایم، داده\u200cهای آموزش سناتیک از کلاس قدیمی را با استفاده از مدل NER آموزش داده می\u200cسازیم، و آموزش کلاس جدید را افزایش می\u200cدهیم. ما یک چهارچوب دیگر توسعه می\u200cکنیم که از مدل موجود با اطلاعات سناتیک و اطلاعات واقعی از مجموعه آموزش فعلی جدا می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور ما بر روی خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cهای موجود بهترین\u200cهای بزرگی می\u200cرسد.', 'sq': 'Puna e mëparshme e mësimit në klasë për njohjen e emëruar të njësisë (NER) mbështetet në supozimin se ekziston mjaft të dhëna të etiketuara për trajnimin e klasave të reja. In this work, we study a more challenging but practical problem, \\emph{i.e.}, few-shot class-incremental  learning for NER, where an NER model is trained with only few labeled samples of the new classes, without forgetting knowledge of the old ones.  Për të lehtësuar problem in e harrimit katastrofik në mësimin më të vogël në klasë, ne rindërtojmë të dhënat sintetike të trajnimit të klasave të vjetra duke përdorur modelin e trajnuar NER, duke rritur trajnimin e klasave të reja. Ne zhvillojmë më tej një kuadër që distillon nga modeli ekzistues me të dhëna sintetike dhe të dhëna reale nga grupi i trenimit aktual. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja jonë arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme mbi linjat bazë ekzistuese.', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የክፍለ-ስርዓት መምህርት ማወቅ (NER) በአዲስ ደረጃዎች ለማስተማር ብዙዎች የጽሑፍ ዳታ እንዳለ በመስመር ላይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የበለጠ አዋቂ ነገር ግን ተግባራዊ ጉዳይ እናምራለን፣ ለNER መማር ጥቂት የደረጃ ክፍል የሚያስተምረን፣ በአሮጌዎቹን ማወቅ ሳይረሳ የNER ሞዴል በጥቂት የበለጠ ምሳሌዎች ብቻ የተማረ ነው፡፡ በጥቂት ደረጃ-ተማሪ ውስጥ የረሳውን የግጭት ጉዳይ ለማሳየት፣ የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች የተጠቃሚ NER model በመጠቀም የአዲስ ደረጃ ማስተማርን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ሞዴል ከስንቲካዊ ዳታ እና የአሁኑን ትምህርት ዳታ የሚለየውን ፍሬማር እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የእኛ መግለጫ በአሁኑ መቀመጫዎች ላይ የበለጠ ጥናት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Անվանված անհատականության ճանաչման (ՆԵՌ) դասարանի աճող ուսումնասիրության նախկին աշխատանքը հիմնված է այն ենթադրության վրա, որ գոյություն ունի բազմաթիվ պիտակ տվյալներ նոր դասարանների ուսումնասիրության համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ավելի դժվար, բայց պրակտիկ խնդիր՝ \\ Emph{i.e.}, մի քանի անգամ ավելացված դասարանի ուսումնասիրություն ՆԵՌ-ի համար, որտեղ ՆԵՌ-ի մոդելը վարժեցվում է նոր դասարանների միայն մի քանի պիտակ նմուշներով, առանց մոռանալու հին դասարանների Մենք վերականգնում ենք հին դասերի սինթետիկ ուսուցման տվյալները, օգտագործելով սովորեցված ՆԵՌ մոդելը, աճելով նոր դասերի ուսուցման գործընթացը: Մենք նաև զարգանում ենք մի կառուցվածք, որը տարբերվում է գոյություն ունեցող մոդելուց, ինչպես սինթետիկ տվյալներով, ինչպես նաև իրական տվյալներով ներկայիս ուսուցման համակարգում: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը գոյություն ունի գոյություն ունեցող հիմնական գծերի մեջ նշանակալի բարելավումներ:', 'az': 'Adlı Entity Recognition (NER) üçün ilk sınıf-artımlı öyrənməsinin əvvəlki işi yeni sınıf təhsil üçün etiket edilmiş məlumatların çoxluğuna dayanır. Bu i şdə daha çətin, amma praktik problem i öyrənirik, \\emph{i.e.}, NER üçün çox çətin sınıf-artımlı “ öyrənmə ”, ki, NER modeli yeni sınıfların az nümunələri ilə təhsil edilir, əvvəlkilərin elmi unutmadan. Bir neçə dəstə artırma öyrənməsindən unutduğu katastrofi problemlərini azaltmaq üçün, əvvəlki dəstələrin sintetik təhsil məlumatlarını təhsil edilmiş NER modelini və yeni dəstələrin təhsil etməsini artırmaq üçün yenidən in şa edirik. Biz də həmin modelden sintetik məlumatları və həmin təhsil qutusundan gerçek məlumatları ilə ayrılan bir framework ü düzəltdik. Həqiqətən, təcrübə sonuçları bizim tərzimiz mövcuddur baz çətinlərin üstündə mövcuddur.', 'bn': 'নামের এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতির (NER) পূর্ববর্তী ক্লাসের ক্ষেত্রে অগ্রগতির শিক্ষা নির্ভর করে এই ধারণার উপর নির্ভর করে যে নতুন শ্রেণীর প্রশ এই কাজে আমরা আরো চ্যালেঞ্জিক কিন্তু ব্যাক্তিগত সমস্যা গবেষণা করছি, \\Emph {i.e.}, কয়েকটি গুলি শ্রেণীর ক্ষেত্রে শিক্ষা প্রদান করি, যেখানে একটি নতুন শ্রেণীর মডেল শিক্ষা প্রদ কয়েকটি গুলি শ্রেণীতে ভুলে যাওয়ার ক্ষেত্রে বিপর্যয়ের সমস্যা কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য, আমরা পুরোনো শ্রেণীর মডেল ব্যবহার করে প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য পুনরায় তৈর আমরা আরো একটা ফ্রেম উন্নয়ন করি যা বর্তমান মডেল থেকে বিচ্ছিন্ন করে থাকে সিন্টেটিক ডাটা এবং বর্তমান প্রশিক্ষণের সেট থেকে আসল ত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া বিদ্যমান বেস লাইনের ব্যাপারে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পা', 'cs': 'Předchozí práce inkrementálního učení pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER) vychází z předpokladu, že existuje množství označených dat pro výcvik nových tříd. V této práci se zabýváme náročnějším, ale praktickým problémem, \\emph{i.d.}, několika přírůstkovými učeními pro NER, kde je model NER trénován pouze s několika označenými vzorky nových tříd, aniž bychom zapomněli na znalosti těch starých. Abychom zmírnili problém katastrofického zapomínání v přírůstkovém učení, rekonstruujeme syntetická tréninková data starých tříd pomocí trénovaného modelu NER a rozšíříme trénink nových tříd. Dále vyvíjíme rámec, který destiluje ze stávajícího modelu jak se syntetickými daty, tak reálnými daty ze současné školicí sady. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup dosahuje významných zlepšení oproti stávajícím základním liniím.', 'bs': 'Prethodni rad klase incrementalnog učenja za priznanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) oslanja se na pretpostavku da postoji dosta označenih podataka za obuku novih klasa. U ovom poslu, proučavamo izazovniji, ali praktičniji problem, \\emph{i.e.}, nekoliko snimanja klase incrementalnog učenja za NER, gdje je model NER obučen samo sa nekoliko označenih uzorka novih klasa, bez zaboravljanja znanja starih. Da bismo ublažili problem katastrofičkog zaboravljanja u nekoliko stupnjeva klasnog incrementalnog učenja, rekonstruirali smo sintetičke podatke obuke starih časova koristeći obučeni model NER-a, povećavajući obuku novih časova. Dalje razvijamo okvir koji razlikuje od postojećeg model a i sintetičkim podacima i pravim podacima od trenutnog seta obuke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postigne značajne poboljšanje na postojećim osnovnim linijama.', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tunnustamise (NER) klassi täiendõppe varasem töö tugineb eeldusele, et uute klasside koolitamiseks on olemas märgistatud andmeid. Käesolevas töös uurime keerulisemat, kuid praktilisemat probleemi \\emph{s.t.}, NER-i jaoks mõne võimalusega klassi täiendavat õppimist, kus NER-i mudelit koolitatakse ainult mõne märgistatud näidisega uutest klassidest, unustamata teadmisi vanadest klassidest. Katastroofilise unustamise probleemi leevendamiseks vähese võimalusega klassi täiendõppes rekonstrueerime vanade klasside sünteetilised treeningandmed koolitatud NER mudeli abil, täiustades uute klasside koolitust. Arendame edasi raamistikku, mis destilleerib olemasolevast mudelist nii sünteetiliste andmete kui ka praeguse koolituse reaalsete andmetega. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis saavutab olulisi parandusi võrreldes olemasolevate lähtejoontega.', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistuksen (NER) luokkalisäopetuksen aiempi työ perustuu oletukseen, että uusien luokkien koulutukseen on olemassa runsaasti merkittyjä tietoja. Tässä työssä tutkitaan haastavampaa mutta käytännönläheisempää ongelmaa, \\emph{i.e.}, NER:lle, jossa NER-mallia koulutetaan vain muutamalla merkinnällä varustetulla näytteellä uusista tunneista unohtamatta vanhojen tuntemusta. Parantaaksemme katastrofaalisen unohtamisen ongelmaa muutaman laukauksen luokkakerrannaisessa oppimisessa rekonstruoimme vanhojen luokkien synteettistä harjoitusdataa koulutetun NER-mallin avulla lisäten uusien luokkien koulutusta. Kehitämme edelleen viitekehystä, joka tislautuu olemassa olevasta mallista sekä synteettisestä datasta että todellisesta datasta nykyisestä koulutuskokonaisuudesta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme saavuttaa merkittäviä parannuksia nykyisiin lähtökohtiin verrattuna.', 'ca': "La feina anterior de l'aprenentatge incremental de classe per la Recognició de Nomada Entitat (NER) es basa en la suposició de que hi ha abundància de dades etiquetades per l'entrenament de noves classes. En aquest treball estudiem un problem a més desafiant però pràctic, \\emph{i.e.}, aprenentatge de classe incremental amb poques fotos per a NER, on un model NER està entrenat amb només poques mostres etiquetades de les noves classes, sense oblidar el coneixement dels vells. Per aliviar el problema de l'oblidança catastròfica en l'aprenentatge incremental de classes amb pocs tiros, reconstruim dades d'entrenament sintètic de les classes antigues utilitzant el model NER entrenat, augmentant l'entrenament de les noves classes. També desenvolupem un marc que distill del model existent amb dades sintètiques i dades reals del conjunt actual d'entrenament. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre enfocament aconsegueix millores significatives sobre les línies de base existents.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk karo kelas-kelas sing dibenalke nggawe gerapakan karo NeR Nan iki trabah, kita siweh yatak nggawe luwih-luwih nggawe ketemu karo pakek, nik sekondiki ampar.\\emph {i.e.} Ngawe ngejarian seneng kalapasan kelalaman sing paling nggawe barang kelas telas-kelas, awak dhéwé ngejarian seneng nggawe data seneng nggawe kelas tualah Awak dhéwé uga luwih-luwih sistem sing wis dipulang sak model sing ana dadi sing dadi winih, lan data sing dirakno ngono nggawe aturan tambah. Pametuné sing paling kelas kuwi dianggawe bener tentang kanggo dianggawe barang nggawe barang sing nyimpen.', 'ha': "Tayyar da zaman aikin da aka sanar da wa masu ƙaranci na kure wa AJinta Entity Daga wannan aikin, munã karatun wata masu ƙaranci kuma masu kashewa, /misali, /misali, masu ƙaranci da aka yi wa karatun dansi na NER, inda an sanar da misãlai masu ƙaranci kaɗan na samfani na kuren sãbuwa, kuma bã ya manta kunna gamuwa. Ili iya sauƙaƙara wa matar da aka mantar da shi a cikin ma'anar-dansi kaɗan-sauran, za mu sãka wa dandandangi na zaman kure da aka tsare shi da misalin na NER, kuma Mu ƙara yin ƙidãya wa tsarin dansi na sãbuwa. Ko ƙari, Muke ƙãga wani firam wanda ke rarraba daga shirin wannan da ke sami da data na synthetic, da data masu gaskiya daga tsarin mafarin da ke kai yanzu. Matarin jarrabai ke nũna cewa hanyarmu yana sãmun mafiya kyauta mai girma a kanzu.", 'he': 'העבודה הקודמת של הלימודים המספרים בכיתה עבור זיהוי איכות בשם (NER) תלויה בהנחה שיש מספיק נתונים מסומנים לאימון של כיסות חדשות. בעבודה הזו, אנו לומדים בעיה יותר מאתגרת אבל מעשית, \\emph{i.e.}, למידה מספר צילומים בכיתה-מוספת עבור NER, שבו דוגמא NER מאומנת עם רק מעט דגימות מסוימות של הכיתות החדשות, מבלי לשכוח ידע על הישנים. כדי להקל על הבעיה של שכחות קטסטרופית בלימודים משותפים בכיתה קטנה, אנו מבנים מחדש נתוני אימון סינטטי של הכיתות הישנות באמצעות מודל NER מאומן, מגדיל את האימודים של כיסויים חדשים. אנחנו מפתחים עוד מסגרת שמדחפת מהמודל הנוכחי עם שני נתונים סינטטיים, ובנתונים אמיתיים ממערכת האימונים הנוכחית. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהגישה שלנו משיגה שיפורים משמעותיים מעל קווי בסיס קיימים.', 'sk': 'Predhodno delo razrednega učenja za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov (NER) temelji na predpostavki, da obstaja obilo označenih podatkov za usposabljanje novih razredov. V tem delu preučujemo zahtevnejši, a praktičen problem \\emph{t.j.}, nekaj poskusov učenja v razredu za NER, kjer se model NER trenira z le nekaj označenimi vzorci novih razredov, ne da bi pozabili na znanje starih. Da bi ublažili problem katastrofalnega pozabljanja pri učenju z nekaj priložnostmi, s pomočjo usposobljenega modela NER rekonstruiramo sintetične podatke o usposabljanju starih razredov, kar povečuje usposabljanje novih razredov. Nadalje razvijamo okvir, ki izhaja iz obstoječega modela s sintetičnimi podatki in resničnimi podatki iz trenutnega nabora usposabljanj. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da naš pristop dosega znatne izboljšave v primerjavi z obstoječimi osnovnimi vrednostmi.', 'bo': 'Named Entity Recognition In this work, we study a more challenging but practical problem, \\emph{i.e.}, few-shot class-incremental  learning for NER, where an NER model is trained with only few labeled samples of the new classes, without forgetting knowledge of the old ones. To alleviate the problem of catastrophic forgotten in ། few-shot class-incremental learning, we reconstruct synthetic training data of the old classes using the trained NER model, increasing the training of new classes. ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ངོ་མ་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ནས་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་གཞི་གཞི་རྟེན་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་གཏོང'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'تحسين التعلم التلوي لتصنيف النصوص منخفضة الموارد وإنشائها عن طريق تقليد الذاكرة', 'fr': 'Améliorer le méta-apprentissage pour la classification et la génération de textes à faibles ressources par imitation de mémoire', 'es': 'Mejora del meta-aprendizaje para la clasificación y generación de textos de bajos recursos mediante la imitación de memoria', 'pt': 'Aprimorando o meta-aprendizado para classificação e geração de texto com poucos recursos por meio de imitação de memória', 'ja': 'メモリイミテーションによる低リソースのテキスト分類と生成のためのメタラーニングの改善', 'zh': '记模改善低资源文本分类成元', 'hi': 'स्मृति अनुकरण के माध्यम से कम संसाधन पाठ वर्गीकरण और पीढ़ी के लिए मेटा-लर्निंग में सुधार', 'ru': 'Улучшение метаобучения для малоресурсной классификации и генерации текста посредством имитации памяти', 'ga': 'Meitea-fhoghlaim a Fheabhsú le haghaidh Aicmiú agus Giniúint Téacs ar Acmhainn Íseal trí Aithriseoireacht Chuimhne', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Meta-tanulás javítása az alacsony erőforrású szövegosztályozáshoz és -generáláshoz memóriautánzaton keresztül', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της μετα-μάθησης για ταξινόμηση και δημιουργία κειμένου χαμηλού πόρου μέσω απομίμησης μνήμης', 'mk': 'Подобрување на метаучењето за класификација и генерација на текст со ниски ресурси преку имитација на меморијата', 'kk': 'Жады көлемі арқылы төменгі ресурс мәтінді классификациялау және құру үшін мета оқыту', 'it': "Migliorare il metaapprendimento per la classificazione e la generazione di testi a basso contenuto di risorse tramite l'imitazione della memoria", 'lt': 'Metamokymosi gerinimas mažai išteklių turintiems tekstams klasifikuoti ir generuoti naudojant atminties imitaciją', 'ml': 'കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മെറ്റാ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതു് മെമ്മറി ഇമിട്ടീഷന്\u200d മുഖേന പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d വി', 'ms': 'Improving Meta-learning for Low-resource Text Classification and Generation via Memory Imitation', 'mt': 'Titjib fil-Metatagħlim għall-Klassifikazzjoni u l-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test b’Riżorsi Bażi permezz tal-Imitazzjoni tal-Memorja', 'mn': 'Маш бага баялаг боловсролын текст хэлбэрийн болон үүсгэлтийн мета суралцлагын сайжруулах', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea metaînvățării pentru clasificarea și generarea textelor cu resurse reduse prin imitația memoriei', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje metaučenja za klasifikaciju i generaciju teksta niskih resursa putem imitacije pamćenja', 'no': 'Forbetra metalæring for låg- ressurstekstklassifikasjon og generering ved hjelp av minne', 'pl': 'Poprawa meta-learningu dla klasyfikacji i generowania tekstu niskich zasobów poprzez imitację pamięci', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Förbättra metainlärning för klassificering och generering av text med låga resurser via minnesimitation', 'so': 'Horumarinta barbaarinta Meta-da ee qoraalka fasaxa iyo Generation via Memory Immigration', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'نیچے رسورس ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفٹ اور پیدائش کے ذریعہ مٹا-سیکھنے کے لئے بہتر ہے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tăng cường học hỏi siêu năng lượng cho việc phân bổ văn bản với nguồn thấp bằng trí nhớ', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje metaučenja za klasifikaciju i generaciju teksta niskih resursa putem imitacije pamćenja', 'da': 'Forbedring af metalæring til klassificering og generering af tekst med lav ressource via hukommelse imiteret', 'nl': 'Verbetering van meta-learning voor low-resource tekstclassificatie en -generatie via geheugenimitatie', 'bg': 'Подобряване на метаобучението за класификация и генериране на текстове с ниски ресурси чрез имитация на памет', 'id': 'Menembangkan Meta-belajar untuk Klasifikasi Teks dan Generasi Sumber Terrendah melalui Imitasi Memori', 'de': 'Verbesserung des Meta-Lernens für ressourcenschonende Textklassifizierung und -generierung mittels Memory Imitation', 'ko': '기억 모방을 통해 저자원 텍스트의 분류와 생성을 개선하는 원 학습', 'fa': 'بهترین یادگیری متا برای کلاس\u200cسازی و تولید متن کم منبع از طریق تصویر حافظه', 'sw': 'Improving Meta-learning for Low-resource Text Classification and Generation via Memory Imitation', 'sq': 'Improving Meta-learning for Low-resource Text Classification and Generation via Memory Imitation', 'af': 'Verbeter Meta- leer vir Laag- hulpbron Teks Klassifikasie en Generasie deur Geheue Imitasie', 'tr': 'Meta-öwrenmek üçin Az-Ressurat Metin Sınıflandyrma we Taýýarlama', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ እና ትውልድ በመጠየቅ ማቀናጃ', 'hy': 'Մետասովորելու բարելավումը ցածր ռեսուրսների տեքստի դասակարգման և ստեղծման համար հիշողության պատկերացման միջոցով', 'bn': 'নিম্নলিখিত সম্পদের টেক্সট ক্লাসিং এবং জেনারেশনের জন্য মেটা শিক্ষা বাড়ানো হচ্ছে', 'az': 'Aşağı-çoxlu Metin Klasifikasiyası və Yenilməsi üçün Meta öyrənməsi yaxşılaşdırılır', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje metaučenja za klasifikaciju i generaciju teksta niskih resursa putem imitacije pamćenja', 'ca': 'Improving Meta-learning for Low-resource Text Classification and Generation via Memory Imitation', 'cs': 'Zlepšení meta-learningu pro klasifikaci a generování textu s nízkými zdroji prostřednictvím imitace paměti', 'et': 'Metaõppe parandamine vähese ressursiga teksti klassifitseerimiseks ja genereerimiseks mälu jäljendamise kaudu', 'fi': 'Meta-oppimisen parantaminen vähäresurssisen tekstin luokittelun ja generoinnin avulla muistijäljennöksen avulla', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'שיפור את המטה-לימוד עבור שיפור טקסט משאבים נמוכים ויוצר באמצעות זיכרון', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje metaučenja za klasifikacijo in ustvarjanje besedila z nizkimi viri prek posnemanja spomina', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉུང་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དང་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཀྱི་ཚད་གཞུང་སློབ་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'Currently, Medical Subject Headings (MeSH) are manually assigned to every biomedical article published and subsequently recorded in the PubMed database to facilitate retrieving relevant information. With the rapid growth of the PubMed database, large-scale biomedical document indexing becomes increasingly important. MeSH indexing is a challenging task for machine learning, as it needs to assign multiple labels to each article from an extremely large hierachically organized collection. To address this challenge, we propose KenMeSH, an end-to-end model that combines new text features and a dynamic knowledge-enhanced mask attention that integrates document features with MeSH label hierarchy and journal correlation features to index MeSH terms. Experimental results show the proposed method achieves state-of-the-art performance on a number of measures.', 'ar': 'يمثل بناء نماذج معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) تحديًا في سيناريوهات الموارد المنخفضة حيث تتوفر بيانات محدودة. تحقق خوارزميات التعلم التلوي المستندة إلى التحسين نتائج واعدة في سيناريوهات الموارد المنخفضة من خلال تكييف تهيئة نموذج جيد التعميم للتعامل مع المهام الجديدة. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه الأساليب تعاني من مشكلة التحفيظ الزائد ، حيث يميل النموذج إلى حفظ مهام التدريب التلوي مع تجاهل مجموعات الدعم عند التكيف مع المهام الجديدة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح طريقة التعلم التلوي لتقليد الذاكرة (MemIML) التي تعزز اعتماد النموذج على مجموعات الدعم لتكييف المهام. على وجه التحديد ، نقدم وحدة ذاكرة خاصة بالمهمة لتخزين معلومات مجموعة الدعم وإنشاء وحدة تقليد لفرض مجموعات الاستعلام لتقليد سلوك مجموعات الدعم المخزنة في الذاكرة. يتم توفير التحليل النظري لإثبات فعالية طريقتنا ، كما توضح النتائج التجريبية أيضًا أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس التنافسية في كل من تصنيف النص ومهام الإنشاء.', 'pt': 'A construção de modelos de processamento de linguagem natural (NLP) é um desafio em cenários de poucos recursos, onde dados limitados estão disponíveis. Algoritmos de meta-aprendizagem baseados em otimização alcançam resultados promissores em cenários de poucos recursos, adaptando uma inicialização de modelo bem generalizada para lidar com novas tarefas. No entanto, essas abordagens sofrem com o problema de overfitting de memorização, onde o modelo tende a memorizar as tarefas de metatreinamento enquanto ignora os conjuntos de suporte ao se adaptar a novas tarefas. Para resolver esse problema, propomos um método de meta-aprendizagem de imitação de memória (MemIML) que aumenta a dependência do modelo em conjuntos de suporte para adaptação de tarefas. Especificamente, introduzimos um módulo de memória específico para tarefas para armazenar informações do conjunto de suporte e construímos um módulo de imitação para forçar os conjuntos de consultas a imitar os comportamentos dos conjuntos de suporte armazenados na memória. Uma análise teórica é fornecida para provar a eficácia do nosso método, e os resultados empíricos também demonstram que nosso método supera as linhas de base competitivas em tarefas de classificação e geração de texto.', 'fr': "La création de modèles de traitement du langage naturel (NLP) est un défi dans les scénarios à faibles ressources où les données disponibles sont limitées. Les algorithmes de méta-apprentissage basés sur l'optimisation obtiennent des résultats prometteurs dans des scénarios à faibles ressources en adaptant une initialisation de modèle bien généralisée pour gérer de nouvelles tâches. Néanmoins, ces approches souffrent du problème de suradaptation de la mémorisation, le modèle ayant tendance à mémoriser les tâches de méta-entraînement tout en ignorant les ensembles de support lors de l'adaptation à de nouvelles tâches. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons une méthode de méta-apprentissage par imitation de mémoire (MeMiML) qui renforce la dépendance du modèle à l'égard des ensembles de support pour l'adaptation des tâches. Plus précisément, nous introduisons un module de mémoire spécifique à une tâche pour stocker des informations sur les ensembles de support et construisons un module d'imitation pour forcer les ensembles de requêtes à imiter les comportements des ensembles de support stockés dans la mémoire. Une analyse théorique est fournie pour prouver l'efficacité de notre méthode, et les résultats empiriques démontrent également que notre méthode surpasse les niveaux de référence concurrentiels à la fois pour les tâches de classification de texte et de génération.", 'es': 'La creación de modelos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) es un desafío en escenarios de bajos recursos en los que hay datos limitados disponibles. Los algoritmos de meta-aprendizaje basados en la optimización logran resultados prometedores en escenarios de bajos recursos al adaptar una inicialización de modelo bien generalizada para gestionar nuevas tareas. Sin embargo, estos enfoques sufren el problema del sobreajuste de memorización, en el que el modelo tiende a memorizar las tareas de metaentrenamiento mientras ignora los conjuntos de soporte cuando se adapta a nuevas tareas. Para abordar este problema, proponemos un método de meta-aprendizaje de imitación de memoria (MeMIML) que mejora la dependencia del modelo de los conjuntos de soporte para la adaptación de tareas. Específicamente, introducimos un módulo de memoria específico de la tarea para almacenar información de conjuntos de soporte y construimos un módulo de imitación para forzar a los conjuntos de consultas a imitar los comportamientos de los conjuntos de soporte almacenados en la memoria. Se proporciona un análisis teórico para demostrar la eficacia de nuestro método, y los resultados empíricos también demuestran que nuestro método supera a las líneas de base competitivas en las tareas de clasificación y generación de textos.', 'ja': '自然言語処理（ NLP ）のモデルを構築することは、限られたデータが利用可能な低リソースシナリオでは困難です。 最適化ベースのメタラーニングアルゴリズムは、新しいタスクを処理するためによく一般化されたモデル初期化を適応させることによって、低リソースシナリオで有望な結果を達成します。 それにもかかわらず、これらのアプローチは暗記過適合の問題に苦しみ、モデルは新しいタスクに適応するときにサポートセットを無視してメタトレーニングタスクを暗記する傾向がある。 この問題に対処するために、私たちはメモリ模倣メタラーニング（ MemIML ）メソッドを提案します。このメソッドは、モデルがタスク適応のサポートセットに依存することを強化します。 具体的には、サポートセット情報を格納するためのタスク固有のメモリモジュールを導入し、メモリに格納されたサポートセットの挙動を模倣するためにクエリセットを強制するための模倣モジュールを構築します。 私たちの方法の有効性を証明するための理論的分析が提供されており、実証結果はまた、私たちの方法がテキスト分類と生成タスクの両方で競合ベースラインを上回っていることを示しています。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) के निर्माण मॉडल कम-संसाधन परिदृश्यों में चुनौतीपूर्ण है जहां सीमित डेटा उपलब्ध हैं। अनुकूलन-आधारित मेटा-लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम नए कार्यों को संभालने के लिए एक अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत मॉडल प्रारंभिकता को अनुकूलित करके कम-संसाधन परिदृश्यों में आशाजनक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। फिर भी, ये दृष्टिकोण संस्मरण ओवरफिटिंग मुद्दे से पीड़ित हैं, जहां मॉडल नए कार्यों के अनुकूल होने पर समर्थन सेट को अनदेखा करते हुए मेटा-प्रशिक्षण कार्यों को याद रखता है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम एक स्मृति अनुकरण मेटा-लर्निंग (MemIML) विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो कार्य अनुकूलन के लिए समर्थन सेट पर मॉडल की निर्भरता को बढ़ाता है। विशेष रूप से, हम समर्थन सेट जानकारी को संग्रहीत करने और स्मृति में संग्रहीत समर्थन सेट के व्यवहार की नकल करने के लिए क्वेरी सेट को मजबूर करने के लिए एक अनुकरण मॉड्यूल का निर्माण करने के लिए एक कार्य-विशिष्ट स्मृति मॉड्यूल पेश करते हैं। हमारी विधि की प्रभावशीलता को साबित करने के लिए एक सैद्धांतिक विश्लेषण प्रदान किया जाता है, और अनुभवजन्य परिणाम यह भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारी विधि पाठ वर्गीकरण और पीढ़ी के कार्यों दोनों पर प्रतिस्पर्धी आधार रेखाओं को मात देती है।', 'ru': 'Построение моделей обработки естественного языка (NLP) является сложной задачей в сценариях с ограниченными ресурсами, где имеются ограниченные данные. Алгоритмы метаобучения, основанные на оптимизации, достигают многообещающих результатов в сценариях с низкими ресурсами, адаптируя хорошо обобщенную инициализацию модели для решения новых задач. Тем не менее, эти подходы страдают от проблемы переобучения запоминания, когда модель, как правило, запоминает задачи мета-обучения, игнорируя наборы поддержки при адаптации к новым задачам. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем метод метаобучения с имитацией памяти (MemIML), который усиливает зависимость модели от наборов поддержки для адаптации задач. В частности, мы вводим модуль памяти, специфичный для конкретной задачи, для хранения информации о наборах поддержки и создаем модуль имитации, чтобы заставить наборы запросов имитировать поведение наборов поддержки, хранящихся в памяти. Теоретический анализ предоставлен для доказательства эффективности нашего метода, а эмпирические результаты также показывают, что наш метод превосходит конкурентные базовые линии как по классификации текста, так и по задачам генерации.', 'zh': '于可数有限之资,构自然语言处 (NLP) 有挑战性。 盖优化元学算法以调广义之初始化以理新务,而致望于资源匮乏之场。 虽然,犹有记拟合,则向于元训练任务,而忽于适新。 为此一念,仿元学(MemIML)法,宜增模形以应集。 具体来说,引入一特定内存模块以储集信息,构一模拟模块以强询其内存。 论验其有效性,实证亦明,文本分类,皆优于争基线。', 'ga': 'Tá sé dúshlánach múnlaí próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP) a thógáil i gcásanna íseal-acmhainne ina bhfuil sonraí teoranta ar fáil. Baineann halgartaim meitea-fhoghlaim atá bunaithe ar bharrfheabhsú torthaí gealltanais i gcásanna íseal-acmhainne trí thúsú samhail dea-ghinearálta a oiriúnú chun tascanna nua a láimhseáil. Mar sin féin, tá na cineálacha cur chuige seo thíos leis an tsaincheist a bhaineann le cuimhneachán ró-fheistithe, áit a mbíonn claonadh ag an tsamhail na tascanna meitea-oiliúna a chur de ghlanmheabhair agus neamhaird á déanamh ag tacair tacaíochta agus iad ag oiriúnú do thascanna nua. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid modh meitefhoghlaim aithrise cuimhne (MemIML) a fheabhsaíonn an tsamhail ag brath ar thacair tacaíochta le haghaidh oiriúnú tascanna. Go sonrach, tugaimid modúl cuimhne tasc-shonrach isteach chun faisnéis tacaithe a stóráil agus chun modúl bréige a thógáil chun tacair fiosrúcháin a bhrú chun aithris a dhéanamh ar iompar tacair tacaíochta atá stóráilte sa chuimhne. Cuirtear anailís theoiriciúil ar fáil chun éifeachtacht ár modha a chruthú, agus léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha freisin go n-éiríonn lenár modh bonnlínte iomaíocha maidir le haicmiú téacs agus tascanna giniúna araon.', 'el': "Η δημιουργία μοντέλων επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας (ΝΛΠ) αποτελεί πρόκληση σε σενάρια χαμηλής χρήσης πόρων όπου υπάρχουν περιορισμένα δεδομένα. Οι αλγόριθμοι μετα-μάθησης που βασίζονται στη βελτιστοποίηση επιτυγχάνουν πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα σε σενάρια χαμηλού πόρου προσαρμόζοντας μια καλά γενικευμένη αρχικοποίηση μοντέλου για να χειριστούν νέες εργασίες. Παρ 'όλα αυτά, αυτές οι προσεγγίσεις υποφέρουν από το πρόβλημα της απομνημόνευσης, όπου το μοντέλο τείνει να απομνημονεύει τις εργασίες μετα-κατάρτισης αγνοώντας τα σύνολα υποστήριξης όταν προσαρμόζεται σε νέες εργασίες. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο απομίμησης μνήμης που ενισχύει την εξάρτηση του μοντέλου από σύνολα υποστήριξης για την προσαρμογή εργασιών. Συγκεκριμένα, εισάγουμε μια ενότητα μνήμης ειδικά για την εργασία για να αποθηκεύσουμε πληροφορίες συνόλου υποστήριξης και να κατασκευάσουμε μια ενότητα απομίμησης για να αναγκάσουμε τα σύνολα ερωτήματος να μιμηθούν τις συμπεριφορές των συνόλων υποστήριξης που αποθηκεύονται στη μνήμη. Μια θεωρητική ανάλυση παρέχεται για να αποδειχθεί η αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου μας, ενώ εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν επίσης ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τις ανταγωνιστικές γραμμές βάσης τόσο στην ταξινόμηση κειμένων όσο και στις εργασίες παραγωγής.", 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvi feldolgozás modelljeinek kiépítése kihívást jelent az alacsony erőforrású forgatókönyvekben, ahol korlátozott adatok állnak rendelkezésre. Az optimalizáláson alapuló metatanulási algoritmusok ígéretes eredményeket érnek el alacsony erőforrás-igényű forgatókönyvekben azáltal, hogy egy jól általánosított modell inicializációt alkalmaznak az új feladatok kezelésére. Mindazonáltal ezek a megközelítések szenvednek a memorizációs túlterhelés problémájától, ahol a modell hajlamos megjegyezni a metaképzési feladatokat, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyja a támogatási halmazokat az új feladatokhoz való alkalmazkodás során. A probléma megoldása érdekében egy memóriaimitációs metatanulási (MemIML) módszert javasolunk, amely fokozza a modell támogatási készletekre való támaszkodását a feladatok adaptációjához. Konkrétan egy feladatspecifikus memóriamodult vezetünk be a támogatási készletek információinak tárolására és egy utánzó modult építünk fel, amely arra kényszeríti a lekérdezési készleteket, hogy utánozzák a memóriában tárolt támogatási készletek viselkedését. Módszerünk hatékonyságának bizonyítására elméleti elemzést nyújtunk, és empirikus eredmények azt is bizonyítják, hogy módszerünk mind a szövegosztályozási, mind a generálási feladatok tekintetében felülmúlja a versenyképes alapokat.', 'ka': 'მოდელური ენის პროცესის მოდელების შექმნა (NLP) ცოტა რესურსის სინარიოში შესაძლებელია, რომლებიც შესაძლებელია ცოტა მონაცემები. აპტიმიზაციის მეტა-სწავლების ალგორიტიმები მიიღებენ, რომლებიც ახალი რამეების გასაკეთებელად უფრო გენერალიზაციული მოდელური ინიზაციაციას აეპორტიზაციით, დასაკეთებელ მაგრამ, ეს დახმარებები მხოლოდ მხოლოდ დაეხმარებული პრობლემადან, სადაც მოდელემა უნდა მეტა-განაკეთებული დავამხმარება, როდესაც ახალი დავამხმარების შემდეგ მეტა-განაკეთებული ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მინდომ მეტა-სწავლების მიმიტაცია მეტა-სწავლების (MemIML) მეტი, რომელიც მოდელის დარწმუნებელობას დავამუშავებს მონაცემი განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ დავაყენებთ მოდულის განსაკუთრებული მეხსიერების მოდულის შენახვა ინფორმაციის დამხმარება და იმიტაციის მოდულის შექმნა, რომ კითხვების მოდულების შესაძლებლობა, რომ მეხსიერ თეორეტიკური ანალიზია, რომელიც ჩვენი მეტის ეფექტიურობას წარმოდგენა, და ემპერიკური წარმოდგენები ასევე გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მეტი კონპექტიური ფექტიური ფექტიური და', 'it': "Costruire modelli di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL) è difficile in scenari a basso contenuto di risorse in cui sono disponibili dati limitati. Gli algoritmi di meta-apprendimento basati sull'ottimizzazione raggiungono risultati promettenti in scenari a basso consumo di risorse adattando un'inizializzazione del modello ben generalizzata per gestire nuove attività. Tuttavia, questi approcci soffrono del problema dell'eccesso di memorizzazione, in cui il modello tende a memorizzare i compiti di meta-formazione ignorando i set di supporto quando si adatta a nuovi compiti. Per risolvere questo problema, proponiamo un metodo MemIML (memory imitation meta-learning) che aumenta la dipendenza del modello dai set di supporto per l'adattamento delle attività. Nello specifico, introduciamo un modulo di memoria specifico per attività per memorizzare le informazioni sui set di supporto e costruire un modulo di imitazione per forzare i set di query ad imitare i comportamenti dei set di supporto memorizzati nella memoria. Viene fornita un'analisi teorica per dimostrare l'efficacia del nostro metodo, e i risultati empirici dimostrano anche che il nostro metodo supera le linee di base competitive sia per la classificazione del testo che per le attività di generazione.", 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo modelių kūrimas yra sudėtingas mažai išteklių turinčiais scenarijais, kai turima ribotų duomenų. Optimizacija grindžiami metamokymosi algoritmai užtikrina pažangius rezultatus mažų išteklių scenarijuose, pritaikydami gerai generalizuotą modelio inicializaciją naujoms užduotims vykdyti. Vis dėlto šie metodai kenčia nuo atminties pertekliaus įrengimo problemos, kai modelis paprastai prisimena metamokymo užduotis ir ignoruoja paramos rinkinius prisitaikant prie naujų užduočių. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome atminties imitacijos metamokymosi (MemIML) metodą, kuris padidintų modelio priklausomybę nuo darbo pritaikymo paramos rinkinių. Konkrečiai, įvedame užduotims būdingą atminties modulį, kuris saugo paramos rinkinio informaciją ir sukuria imitacijos modulį, kuris priverstų paklausos rinkinius imituoti atminties rinkiniuose saugomų paramos rinkinių elgesį. Siekiant įrodyti mūsų metodo veiksmingumą, pateikiama teorinė analizė, o empiriniai rezultatai taip pat rodo, kad mūsų metodas viršija konkurencines bazines linijas tekstų klasifikavimo ir gamybos užduotyse.', 'ms': 'Bina model pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi (NLP) adalah menantang dalam skenario sumber rendah di mana data terbatas tersedia. Algoritma pembelajaran-meta berasaskan optimisasi mencapai keputusan yang berjanji dalam skenario sumber rendah dengan menyesuaikan inisialisasi model yang luas dengan baik untuk mengendalikan tugas baru. Nonetheless, these approaches suffer from the memorization overfitting issue, where the model tends to memorize the meta-training tasks while ignoring support sets when adapting to new tasks.  Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan kaedah meta-belajar imitasi memori (MemIML) yang meningkatkan kepercayaan model pada set sokongan untuk penyesuaian tugas. Secara khusus, kami memperkenalkan modul memori khusus tugas untuk menyimpan maklumat set sokongan dan membina modul imitasi untuk paksa set pertanyaan untuk imitasi perilaku set sokongan yang disimpan dalam memori. Analisis teori diberikan untuk membuktikan kegunaan kaedah kita, dan hasil empirik juga menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melampaui garis dasar kompetitif pada kedua-dua kelasukan teks dan tugas generasi.', 'kk': 'Түзіндік тілді өңдеу үлгілерін құру (NLP) шектелген деректер қол жеткізген жерде төмен ресурстар сценариясында көмектеседі. Оптимизация негіздеген мета оқыту алгоритмдері жаңа тапсырмаларды басқару үшін жалпы жалпы үлгі инициализациялау үшін төмен ресурстар сценариясының нәтижесін жеткізеді. Әйтпесе, бұл жағдайлар жаттамасының көмектесу мәселесінен өтеді. Бұл үлгі жаңа тапсырмаларда адаптау кезінде мета- оқыту тапсырмаларын еске салуға әсер етеді. Бұл мәселеге шешу үшін, тапсырмаларды қолдау баптауларының үшін үлгісінің сенімділігін көшірмелейтін мета- оқыту (MemIML) әдісін қолданамыз. Мәліметті сақтау үшін тапсырманың ерекше жады модулін келтіріп, жадында сақталған қолдау параметрлерінің қасиеттерін шектеу үшін сұраныс параметрлерін құру үшін көмектесу модулін құрып берем Теоретикалық анализ біздің тәсіліміздің эффективнігін тексеру үшін келтірілді, және эмпирикалық нәтижелеріміздің тәсіліміздің мәтін классификациясы мен құрылу тапсырмаларының әсер', 'mk': 'Building models of natural language processing (NLP) is challenging in low-resource scenarios where limited data are available.  Алгоритмите за метаучење базирани на оптимизација постигнуваат ветувачки резултати во сценарија со ниски ресурси со адаптирање на добро генерализирана иницијализација на моделот за решавање на новите задачи. Сепак, овие пристапи страдаат од проблемот со преприспособувањето на меморизацијата, каде што моделот има тенденција да ги меморира мета-обуките додека ги игнорира поддршките кога се адаптира на новите задачи. За да го решиме ова прашање, предлагаме метод на имитација на меморијата мета-учење (MemIML) кој ја зголемува зависноста на моделот од поддршките за адаптација на задачите. Специфично, воведуваме модул на меморија специфичен за задачите за зачувување на поддршката на поставените информации и изградба модул на имитација за принудување на поставените прашања за имитација на однесувањата на поставените поддршки зачувани во меморијата Теоретска анализа е обезбедена за да се докаже ефикасноста на нашиот метод, а емпиричките резултати исто така покажуваат дека нашиот метод ги надминува конкурентните основни линии на текстова класификација и генерација на задачи.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്രക്രിയയുടെ (NLP) മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥിതികളില്\u200d വി പുതിയ ജോലികള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി മോഡലിന്റെ തുടക്കം മാറ്റുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പുതിയ ജോലികള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനായി ഉപയോഗപ്പെടുത്തുന് എന്നിട്ടും പുതിയ ജോലികളുടെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റി ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ജോലികളെ മറക്കുന്നു ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, ജോലിയുടെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി മോഡലിന്റെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മെമ്മറിയുടെ മെറ പ്രത്യേകിച്ചാല്\u200d, പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന പിന്തുണയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കാനും മെമ്മറിയില്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പ്രകൃതിയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളെ അന നമ്മുടെ രീതിയുടെ പ്രഭാവം തെളിയിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഒരു തിയോറിക്കല്\u200d അന്വേഷണം നല്\u200dകിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ശാസ്ത്രികമായ ഫലങ്ങളും കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളു', 'no': 'Bygging av modeller for naturspråkshandtering (NLP) er vanskeleg i låg ressursscenarioar der begrensede data er tilgjengeleg. Optimalisasjonsbaserte metalæringsalgoritme oppnår forelæringsresultat i låg ressursscenarioar ved å tilpassa ein godt generellisert modell for å handtera nye oppgåver. Desse tilnærmingane går likevel frå det overpassende problemet for minningar, der modellen har tendens til å minne metatreningsoppgåva medan du ignorerer støtte-innstillingane når du tilpassar nye oppgåver. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi ein metode for å imitere metalæring av minne (MemIML) som styrer modellen på støtte for oppgåvetilpassing. Vi introduserer ein minnemodul for oppgåve for å lagra støtte for sett informasjon og konstruera ein imitasjonsmodul for å tvinge spørjingsstatt for å imitere oppførselen av støtte- sett lagra i minnet. Eit teoretisk analyse er tilgjengeleg for å bevise effektiviteten av metoden vårt, og empiriske resultat også demonstrerer at metoden vårt utfører konkurentære baselinjer på både tekstklassifikasjonar og genereringsoppgåver.', 'mt': "Il-bini ta’ mudelli ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP) huwa sfida f’xenarji b’riżorsi baxxi fejn hemm dejta limitata disponibbli. L-algoritmi ta’ meta-tagħlim ibbażati fuq l-ottimizzazzjoni jiksbu riżultati promettenti f’xenarji b’riżorsi baxxi billi jadattaw inizjalizzazzjoni ta’ mudell ġeneralizzat sew biex jimmaniġġjaw kompiti ġodda. Madankollu, dawn l-approċċi jsofru mill-kwistjoni ta’ tagħmir żejjed għall-memorja, fejn il-mudell għandu t-tendenza li jfakkar il-kompiti ta’ meta-taħriġ filwaqt li jinjora settijiet ta’ appoġġ meta jadatta għal kompiti ġodda. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nipproponu metodu ta' meta-tagħlim tal-imitazzjoni tal-memorja (MemIML) li jtejjeb id-dipendenza tal-mudell fuq settijiet ta' appoġġ għall-adattament tal-kompiti. Speċifikament, a ħna nintroduċu modulu tal-memorja speċifiku għall-kompiti biex in ħażnu l-informazzjoni tas-sett ta’ appoġġ u nibnu modulu ta’ imitazzjoni biex inġiebu settijiet ta’ mistoqsijiet biex jimitaw l-imġibiet tas-settijiet ta’ appoġġ maħżuna fil-memorja. A theoretical analysis is provided to prove the effectiveness of our method, and empirical results also demonstrate that our method outperforms competitive baselines on both text classification and generation tasks.", 'pl': 'Budowanie modeli przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP) stanowi wyzwanie w scenariuszach o niskich zasobach, w których dostępne są ograniczone dane. Algorytmy metauczenia oparte na optymalizacji osiągają obiecujące rezultaty w scenariuszach niskich zasobów poprzez dostosowanie dobrze uogólnionej inicjalizacji modelu do obsługi nowych zadań. Niemniej jednak podejścia te cierpią z powodu problemu nadmiernego zapamiętywania, gdzie model ma tendencję do zapamiętywania zadań meta-treningowych, ignorując zestawy wsparcia podczas adaptacji do nowych zadań. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy metodę metauczenia imitacji pamięci (MemIML), która zwiększa poleganie modelu na zestawach wsparcia dla adaptacji zadań. W szczególności wprowadzamy moduł pamięci specyficznej dla zadania, aby przechowywać informacje o zestawach wsparcia i skonstruować moduł imitacji, aby zmusić zestawy zapytań do imitowania zachowań zestawów wsparcia przechowywanych w pamięci. Przeprowadzono analizę teoretyczną, aby udowodnić skuteczność naszej metody, a wyniki empiryczne pokazują również, że nasza metoda przewyższa konkurencyjne linie bazowe zarówno w zakresie klasyfikacji tekstów, jak i generowania zadań.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) загварын загвар бүтээх нь хязгаарлагдсан мэдээллийг ашиглах бага нөөцийн хувилбаруудын тухай шаардлагатай. Сайн сайжруулах мета суралцах алгоритм нь шинэ ажил зохицуулахын тулд сайн ерөнхийлөгч загварын эхлүүлэлтийг зохицуулж амлалтай үр дүнг бага баялаг нөхцөлд хүргэж байна. Гэвч эдгээр арга барилгууд шинэ ажил дээр давхарлах үед мета сургалтын дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал дасгал асуудлын тухай ойлголттой байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд бид санамжийн мета суралцах (MemIML) арга загварын загварын загварын загварын тусламжтайгаа дэмжих загварын тусламжийг нэмэгдүүлэх арга загварыг санаж байна. Ялангуяа, бид зарцуулсан мэдээллийг хадгалах, төсөөлөлтийн модуль бүтээх, квери set үүдийг санамжид хадгалагдсан дэмжлэх setүүдийн дасгал хөдөлгөөнийг тодорхойлох боломжтой ажил тодорхойлолтой ой ой модуль Теоретикийн шинжилгээ нь бидний арга замын үр дүнтэй байдлыг баталж өгдөг. Эмперикийн үр дүнд мөн бидний арга нь текст хуваалтын, үеийн даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврыг дамжуулан өрсөлдөг суурь шугамнуудыг ил', 'ro': 'Construirea de modele de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL) reprezintă o provocare în scenariile cu resurse reduse în care sunt disponibile date limitate. Algoritmii de meta-învățare bazați pe optimizare obțin rezultate promițătoare în scenarii cu resurse reduse prin adaptarea unei inițializări bine generalizate a modelului pentru a gestiona sarcini noi. Cu toate acestea, aceste abordări suferă de problema suprasolicitării memorizării, în cazul în care modelul tinde să memoreze sarcinile de meta-formare în timp ce ignoră seturile de suport atunci când se adaptează la noi sarcini. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem o metodă de meta-învățare a imitării memoriei (MemIML), care sporește dependența modelului de seturi de suport pentru adaptarea sarcinilor. Mai exact, introducem un modul de memorie specific sarcinii pentru a stoca informațiile seturilor de suport și pentru a construi un modul de imitație pentru a forța seturile de interogare să imite comportamentele seturilor de suport stocate în memorie. O analiză teoretică este furnizată pentru a demonstra eficacitatea metodei noastre, iar rezultatele empirice demonstrează, de asemenea, că metoda noastră depășește liniile de bază competitive atât în ceea ce privește clasificarea textului, cât și sarcinile de generare.', 'so': "Tilmaamaha dhismaha baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah (NLP) waxay ku dhibaataysaa aragtida hoose-resource ee ay ka helaan macluumaad xad ah. Algorithms oo ku saleysan barashada meta-tacliinta waxay heli karaan arimaha loo ballanqaaday, waxayna ka helaan muuqashada hoos-resource si uu u beddelo bilowga model-horumarinta si uu u qabsado shaqooyinka cusub. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dhaqdhaqaaqyadaasu waxay ka xanuunsadaan xaaladda xasuusta la faa'iidada, marka uu modelku xusuusanayo hawlaha waxbarashada meta-tacliinta marka uu ka tago kaalmooyin marka lagu beddelo shaqada cusub. Si aan u qabsado arrintan, waxaannu u soo jeedinaynaa qaababka barashada iskuulka ah ee xusuusta (MemIML) oo ku kordhiya ku kalsoonaanta modellka oo ku xiran kaalmada shaqada. Si gaar ah, waxaan u qabanaynaa qalabka xasuusta oo gaar ah si a an u ilaalinno kaalmada hagitaanka macluumaadka iyo aan u dhisno qalabka la simiyo si aan u qasbno qoraalka la xiriirta si loo simiyo tababarada taageerada xusuusta lagu kaydiyo. A theoretical analysis is provided to prove the effectiveness of our method, and empirical results also demonstrate that our method outperforms competitive baselines on both text classification and generation tasks.", 'sr': 'Izgradavanje modela prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP) izazovno je u scenarijima niskih resursa gde su dostupni ograničeni podaci. Optimizacijski algoritmi na osnovu metaučenja postižu obećavajuće rezultate u scenarijima niskih resursa prilagođavajući dobro generalizovanu inicijalizaciju model a za rješavanje novih zadataka. Međutim, ovi pristupi patiju od problema sa pretjeranom memorizacijom, gde je model tendencija da se sjeti zadataka za metaobuku dok ignorišu sete podrške kada se prilagođava novim zadatacima. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo metodu imitacije pamćenja metaučenja (MemIML), koja povećava pouzdanost model a na sete podrške za adaptaciju zadataka. Posebno, predstavljamo specijalni modul za pamćenje zadataka kako bi skladistili podršku postavljenim informacijama i izgradili imitacijski modul kako bi prisilili postavke zahteva da imitiraju ponašanje set a podrške koje su skladištene u pamćenju. Teoretička analiza se pruža kako bi dokazala učinkovitost našeg metode, a empirički rezultati takođe pokazali da naša metoda nadmašuje konkurentne osnovne linije na obje zadatke za klasifikaciju teksta i generaciju.', 'sv': 'Att bygga modeller för behandling av naturligt språk (NLP) är utmanande i scenarier med låga resurser där begränsade data finns tillgängliga. Optimeringsbaserade meta-inlärningsalgoritmer uppnår lovande resultat i lågresursscenarier genom att anpassa en väl generaliserad modellinitialisering för att hantera nya uppgifter. Ändå lider dessa tillvägagångssätt av problemet med överbelastning, där modellen tenderar att memorera metaträningsuppgifterna samtidigt som man ignorerar stöduppsättningar när man anpassar sig till nya uppgifter. För att lösa detta problem föreslår vi en MemIML-metod för minnesimitation som ökar modellens beroende av stöduppsättningar för uppgiftsanpassning. Specifikt introducerar vi en uppgiftsspecifik minnesmodul för att lagra information om supportuppsättningar och konstruera en imitationsmodul för att tvinga frågeuppsättningar att imitera beteenden hos supportuppsättningar som lagras i minnet. En teoretisk analys tillhandahålls för att bevisa effektiviteten av vår metod, och empiriska resultat visar också att vår metod överträffar konkurrensutsatta baselines i både textklassificering och genereringsuppgifter.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය (NLP) නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩු සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණ සින් අවශ්\u200dයාත්මක විදියට අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විදියට මෙටා ඉගෙන ගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම්වල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩු සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  නමුත්, මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මතකය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, මෙටා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අලුත් වැඩකට සම්බන්ධ වැඩකට මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය කරන්න, අපි මතකය අනුවර්තනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා මෙටා ඉගෙනගන්න (MemIML) විධානයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා මොඩ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ මතක මොඩියුලක් පෙනුම් කරනවා සැකසුම් තොරතුරු සැකසුම් සඳහා සැකසුම් සඳහා සැකසුම් සඳ සාධාරණික විශ්ලේෂණයක් අපේ විධානයේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරනවා අපේ ව', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டின் மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்குதல் (NLP) குறைந்த மூலத்தின் காட்சியில் சவாலாக்குகிறது வரையறை தக புதிய பணிகளை கையாளுவதற்கான மாதிரி துவக்கத்தை மாற்றியமைக்கும் பொருட்டு புதிய செயல்களை கையாளும் பொருட்டு வாக்களிக்கும் முடிவுகளை  ஆனாலும், இந்த அணுகல்கள் நினைவு மீறும் பிரச்சனையிலிருந்து பாதிக்கும், புதிய பணிகளுக்கு ஒதுங்கும்போது மாதிரி மேடா பயிற்சி பணிகளை  இந்த பிரச்சனையை முடிக்க நாம் நினைவகத்தை ஒப்பீடு meta-கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது மாதிரியின் ஆதரவு அமைப் @ info எங்கள் முறைமையின் விளைவை உறுதிப்படுத்துவதற்கு ஒரு தியூரியல் ஆராய்ச்சி வழங்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் விருப்பமான முடிவுகள் நமது முறைமை உரை வகைப', 'ur': 'مڈیلڈ بنانے کی طبیعی زبان پرسس (NLP) کی مڈیلڈ کم رسورس سناریوں میں مشکل ہے جہاں محدودہ ڈیٹا موجود ہے. مٹا سیکھنے والی الگوریٹمیوں پر اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا وعدہ لینے والی نتیجے کم سروسیس سناریوں میں پہنچ رہے ہیں، ایک اچھی عمومی موڈل کی آغاز کرنے کے ذریعے نئی دنیاؤں کے ساتھ اپنا اپنا اپنا اپن لیکن یہ تقریبا یادآوری پر فائدہ اٹھانے والی مسئلہ سے پہنچ رہے ہیں، جہاں مدل مٹا-ترینس کے کاموں کو یادآوری کرنے کی طاقت رکھتا ہے اور مدد کے ساتھ نو کاموں کے ساتھ اٹھانے کے وقت مدد سٹ کو نادانی کرتا ہے. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ایک مٹا-سیکھنے (MemIML) طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو مدل کی امیدواری مسئلہ کے لئے مدد سٹ کے لئے زیادہ اعتماد کرتا ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم ایک task-specific memory module کو معرفی کرتے ہیں کہ سٹ معلومات کی حمایت کرے اور ایک imitation موڈیل بنائیں کہ کوریٹ سٹ کو مضبوط کرے کہ مذمور میں ذخیرے ہوئے مدد سٹ کے رفتاروں کی تصویر کریں. ہمارے طریقے کا اثبات ثابت کرنے کے لئے ایک نظریہ تحلیل دی گئی ہے، اور اثبات کا نتیجہ بھی دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفوں اور نسل کے کاموں پر مساوی بنسٹ لینوں سے زیادہ مساوی کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Name Lekin, bu murakkablar ajratilgan muammolar xotiraga ega bo'ladi. Bu yerda model yangi vazifalar o'zgarishda meta-trening vazifalarini eslab qoladi. Bu muammani boshqarish uchun, biz vazifani adaptlash uchun modelning qoʻllanmalarini oshirish uchun xotira tahrirlash meta- ta'limni o'rganish usulini tahlil qilamiz. @ info: whatsthis Teoretikal analytika metodimizning effektligini tasdiqlash uchun yaratiladi, va muvaffaqiyatli natijalarimizning metodemiz matn classifikasini va avval vazifalarini bajarishimizda rivojlanish natijasini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Xây dựng mô hình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP) thách thức trong các viễn cảnh với nguồn ít người, nơi có ít dữ liệu. Những thuật to án học meta-Learning quang sẽ đạt được kết quả hứa hẹn trong các viễn cảnh hạ tài nguyên bằng cách sử dụng mô hình phổ biến để xử lý các nhiệm vụ mới. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp này bị ảnh hưởng bởi vấn đề việc bỏ qua việc ghi nhớ, nơi mà mô hình có xu hướng ghi nhớ các công việc huấn luyện meta-giáo, trong khi lờ đi các thiết lập hỗ trợ khi thích nghi với các nhiệm vụ mới. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp bắt chước các meta-leaving (MemlL) để làm tăng s ự dựa dẫm của mô hình vào các bộ hỗ trợ cho sửa đổi các nhiệm vụ. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô- đun ký ức đặc nhiệm để lưu dữ liệu bộ hỗ trợ và xây dựng một mô- đun bắt chước để bắt buộc các bộ câu hỏi theo cách thức của các bộ hỗ trợ được cất giữ trong bộ nhớ. Phân tích lý thuyết được cung cấp để chứng minh hiệu quả phương pháp của chúng ta, và kết quả có kinh nghiệm cũng chứng minh rằng phương pháp của chúng ta hoàn thành các nền tảng cạnh tranh về phân loại văn bản và các công việc sản xuất.', 'nl': "Het bouwen van modellen voor natuurlijke taalverwerking (NLP) is een uitdaging in scenario's met weinig resources waar beperkte gegevens beschikbaar zijn. Optimalisatie-gebaseerde meta-learning algoritmes bereiken veelbelovende resultaten in scenario's met weinig resources door een goed generaliseerde model initialisatie aan te passen aan nieuwe taken. Desalniettemin lijden deze benaderingen onder het probleem van memoriseren overfitting, waarbij het model de neiging heeft om de meta-trainingstaken te onthouden terwijl het ondersteuningssets negeert bij het aanpassen aan nieuwe taken. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een memory imitation meta-learning (MemIML) methode voor die de afhankelijkheid van het model op ondersteuningssets voor taakaanpassing vergroot. Specifiek introduceren we een taakspecifieke geheugenmodule om ondersteuningsset informatie op te slaan en een imitatiemodule te bouwen om query sets te dwingen het gedrag van ondersteuningssets die in het geheugen zijn opgeslagen te imiteren. Een theoretische analyse wordt geleverd om de effectiviteit van onze methode te bewijzen, en empirische resultaten tonen ook aan dat onze methode presteert boven concurrerende basislijnen op zowel tekstclassificatie als genereringstaken.", 'hr': 'Izgradavanje modela prirodnog obradivanja jezika (NLP) izazovno je u scenarijima niskih resursa gdje su dostupni ograničeni podaci. Optimizacijski algoritmi na osnovu metaučenja postignu obećavajuće rezultate u scenarijima niskih resursa prilagođavajući dobro generaliziranu inicijalizaciju model a za rješavanje novih zadataka. Svejedno, ovi pristupi patiju od problema s prekompatirajućim sjećanjem, gdje je model tendencija sjetiti zadatke meta obuke dok ignoriraju sete podrške kada se prilagođava novim zadatkama. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo metodu imitacije sjećanja metaučenja (MemIML), koja povećava pouzdanost model a na podršku seta za adaptaciju zadataka. Posebno, predstavljamo specijalni modul za pamćenje zadataka kako bi čuvali podršku postavljenim informacijama i izgradili modul imitacije kako bi natjerali postavke zahtjeva da imitiraju ponašanje set a podrške koje se čuvaju u pamćenju. Teoretska analiza se pruža kako bi dokazala učinkovitost naše metode, a empirički rezultati također pokazali da naša metoda nadmašuje konkurentne osnovne linije na zadatke klasifikacije teksta i generacije.', 'da': 'Opbygning af modeller for behandling af natursprog (NLP) er udfordrende i scenarier med lav ressource, hvor der er begrænsede data til rådighed. Optimeringsbaserede meta-læringsalgoritmer opnår lovende resultater i scenarier med lav ressource ved at tilpasse en velgeneraliseret model initialisering til at håndtere nye opgaver. Ikke desto mindre lider disse tilgange af problemet med overtilpasning af memorisering, hvor modellen har tendens til at huske metatræningsopgaverne, mens man ignorerer støttesæt, når man tilpasser sig nye opgaver. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en MemIML-metode, der øger modellens afhængighed af supportsæt til opgavetilpasning. Specielt introducerer vi et opgavespecifikt hukommelsesmodul til lagring af oplysninger om supportsæt og konstruerer et efterligningsmodul til at tvinge forespørgselssæt til at efterligne adfærden for supportsæt, der er gemt i hukommelsen. Der leveres en teoretisk analyse for at bevise effektiviteten af vores metode, og empiriske resultater viser også, at vores metode overgår konkurrencedygtige basislinjer på både tekstklassifikation og genereringsopgaver.', 'bg': 'Изграждането на модели за обработка на естествения език (НЛП) е предизвикателство в сценарии с ниски ресурси, където има ограничени данни. Алгоритмите за мета-обучение, базирани на оптимизация, постигат обещаващи резултати в сценарии с ниски ресурси чрез адаптиране на добре обобщена инициализация на модела, за да се справят с нови задачи. Въпреки това, тези подходи страдат от проблема с презареждането на паметта, където моделът има тенденция да запомни задачите за мета-обучение, като същевременно игнорира набор от подкрепа при адаптиране към нови задачи. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме метод за метаобучение с имитация на памет (който увеличава зависимостта на модела от набор от помощи за адаптиране на задачите. По-конкретно, въвеждаме специфичен за задачата модул памет за съхраняване на информация за набор от поддръжка и конструираме модул за имитация, за да принудим наборите от заявки да имитират поведението на набор от поддръжка, съхранявани в паметта. Представен е теоретичен анализ, за да се докаже ефективността на метода ни, а емпиричните резултати също показват, че методът ни превъзхожда конкурентните базови линии както при класификацията на текста, така и при задачите за генериране.', 'de': 'Die Entwicklung von Modellen für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache (NLP) ist eine Herausforderung in ressourcenarmen Szenarien, in denen nur begrenzte Daten verfügbar sind. Optimierungsbasierte Meta-Learning-Algorithmen erzielen vielversprechende Ergebnisse in ressourcenarmen Szenarien, indem sie eine gut generalisierte Modellinitialisierung an neue Aufgaben anpassen. Trotzdem leiden diese Ansätze unter dem Problem der Überarbeitung des Speicherns, bei dem das Modell dazu neigt, sich die Meta-Trainingsaufgaben zu merken, während es Unterstützungssets ignoriert, wenn es sich an neue Aufgaben anpasst. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir eine Memory Imitation Meta-Learning (MemIML) Methode vor, die die Abhängigkeit des Modells von Unterstützungssätzen für die Aufgabenanpassung erhöht. Insbesondere führen wir ein aufgabenspezifisches Speichermodul ein, um Supportsatzinformationen zu speichern und ein Imitationsmodul zu konstruieren, um Abfragesätze zu zwingen, das Verhalten von Supportsätzen zu imitieren, die im Speicher gespeichert sind. Eine theoretische Analyse wird durchgeführt, um die Wirksamkeit unserer Methode zu belegen, und empirische Ergebnisse zeigen auch, dass unsere Methode wettbewerbsfähige Baselines sowohl bei Textklassifikations- als auch bei Generierungsaufgaben übertrifft.', 'id': 'Membangun model proses bahasa alam (NLP) adalah tantangan dalam skenario sumber daya rendah di mana data terbatas tersedia. Algoritma meta-belajar berasasi optimisasi mencapai hasil yang berjanji dalam skenario sumber daya rendah dengan mengadaptasi inisialisasi model yang tergeneralisasi dengan baik untuk menangani tugas baru. Namun, pendekatan ini menderita dari masalah overfitting memorization, di mana model cenderung untuk mengingat tugas meta-pelatihan sementara mengabaikan set dukungan ketika mengadaptasi tugas baru. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah metode imitasi memori meta-learning (MemIML) yang meningkatkan kepercayaan model pada set dukungan untuk adaptasi tugas. Secara spesifik, kami memperkenalkan modul memori spesifik tugas untuk menyimpan informasi set dukungan dan membangun modul imitasi untuk memaksa set pertanyaan untuk imitasi perilaku set dukungan yang disimpan dalam memori. A theoretical analysis is provided to prove the effectiveness of our method, and empirical results also demonstrate that our method outperforms competitive baselines on both text classification and generation tasks.', 'ko': '사용 가능한 데이터가 제한된 저자원 장면에서 자연 언어 처리(NLP) 모델을 구축하는 것은 도전적이다.최적화된 원 학습 알고리즘을 바탕으로 저자원 장면에서 양호한 유니버설 모델 초기화를 조정하여 새로운 임무를 처리함으로써 좋은 효과를 거두었다.그럼에도 불구하고 이러한 방법은 기억이 과도하게 일치하는 문제점이 존재한다. 즉, 모델은 메모리 트레이닝 임무를 경향하고 새로운 임무에 적응할 때 지원 집합을 소홀히 하는 것이다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 모델이 임무 적응 지원 집합에 대한 의존도를 강화하는 메모리 모방 원 학습(MemIML) 방법을 제시했다.구체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 임무에 특정한 메모리 모듈을 도입하여 지원 집합 정보를 저장하고, 시뮬레이션 모듈을 구축하여 조회 집합이 메모리에 저장된 지원 집합의 행위를 강제로 조회한다.이론 분석은 우리의 방법의 유효성을 증명했고 실증 결과도 우리의 방법이 텍스트 분류와 생성 임무에서 경쟁 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'ساختن مدل\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی (NLP) در سیناریو\u200cهای کم منابع مشکل است که داده\u200cهای محدود در دسترس دارند. الگوریتم\u200cهای یادگیری متا بر پایه optimization به نتایج وعده\u200cدهنده در سیناریو\u200cهای منابع کم رسیده می\u200cشود با توجه به یک آغاز مدل عمومی خوب برای کنترل کارهای جدید. با این حال، این روش\u200cها از موضوع حافظه\u200cسازی زیادی دردناک می\u200cشوند، جایی که مدل می\u200cتواند کار آموزش متا را به خاطر یاد آوری کند، در حالی که در حالی که تغییر پشتیبانی مجموعه می\u200cشود، در حالی که به کار جدید تغییر برای حل این مسئله، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش یادگیری meta-learning (MemIML) حافظه\u200cای که اعتماد مدل را بر مجموعه\u200cهای پشتیبانی برای تغییر دادن کار بیشتر می\u200cدهد. به طور خاص، ما یک مدول حافظه خاصی برای ذخیره کردن پشتیبانی اطلاعات تنظیم و ساختن یک مدول تصویر برای مجبور کردن مجموعه\u200cهای پرسیدن برای تصویر رفتار مجموعه\u200cهای پشتیبانی که در حافظه ذخیره شده\u200cاند را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. یک تحلیل نظریه برای ثابت کردن موثیت روش ما است، و نتیجه امپراتیک هم نشان می دهد که روش ما پایگاه\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cای را بر روی مسابقه\u200cهای متن و نسل\u200cها پایین\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cای انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': "Kujenga mifano ya upasuaji wa lugha asilia (NLP) inachangamoto katika maeneo ya rasilimali chini ambapo taarifa zilizopo mipaka. Algorithi za kujifunza kwa meta zilizo msingi wa uchambuzi hupata matumaini yanayoahidiwa kutokana na hali ya chini ya rasilimali kwa kubadilisha mwanzo wa mifano yenye vizuri ili kukabiliana na kazi mpya. Hata hivyo, mbinu hizi zinakabiliwa na suala la kukumbuka, ambapo model huenda kukumbusha kazi za mafunzo ya meta wakati wakisahau misaada inapanda pale inapochanganya kazi mpya. To address this issue, we propose a memory imitation meta-learning (MemIML) method that enhances the model's reliance on support sets for task adaptation.  Kwa ujumla, tunaanzisha kiungo cha kumbukumbu maalum cha kufanya kazi ili kuhifadhi msaada wa kutengeneza taarifa na kutengeneza kifaa cha uchunguzi ili kuzuia tabia za misaada zilizowekwa katika kumbukumbu. Uchambuzi wa nadharia unatolewa ili kuthibitisha ufanisi wa njia yetu, na matokeo ya msisimu pia yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inafanya misingi ya ushindani katika kazi za usambazaji wa maandishi na vizazi vya kizazi.", 'af': "Bybou modele van natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP) is uitgelê in lae-hulpbron scenarios waar beperkte data beskikbaar is. Optimalisasie-gebaseerde meta-leer algoritme bereik belofte resultate in lae-hulpbron-scenarios deur 'n goed-generaliseerde model inisialisering te pas om nuwe taak te hanteer. Alleen, hierdie toegang lyk van die memorisasie oorvloedig aangaan, waar die model tendeer om die meta-oefening-taak te onthou terwyl die ondersteuning-stel ignoreer wanneer aan nuwe taak aanpasmaak word. Om hierdie probleem te adres, voorstel on s 'n geheue imitasie meta-leer (MemIML) metode wat die model se vertrouing op ondersteunde stelle vir taak aanpassing verbeter. Spesifieke, ons introduseer 'n taak spesifieke geheue module om ondersteun stel inligting te stoor en 'n imitasie module te bou om navraag stel te forseer om die gedrag van ondersteunde stel in die geheue te imiteer. 'n Teoreetiese analisie is verskaf om die effektiviteit van ons metode te bevestig, en empiriese resultate ook te wys dat ons metode mededingslige basisline uitvoer op beide teks klasifikasie en generasietaak.", 'tr': 'Doýal dil işlemeginiň (NLP) nusgalarynyň düşür-çeşme senaryýasynda mümkin edýär. Optimaliýa tabanly meta-öwrenme algoritmalary täze zady çykmak üçin ýene-de çoxlu nusgalar çykaryp, umut senaryýasynda sowlanýan netijesi başarar. Bu ýagdaýda, bu ýagdaýlar täze zada üýtgetmek üçin meta-bilim taýýarlaryny ýatlamak üçin çykýar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, biz meta-öwrenmek üçin bir yada imitaýýasyny teklip edýäris. Bu nusga gören adaptasiýa üçin nusgasyny gowlaýar. Adatça, biz takyk etmek üçin takyk etmek üçin bir täblisaň hatyň modini girdirdirip durmuşy gaýd etmek üçin bir daýtgeşdirmek üçin bir modi bejerýäris Teoriki analyzasy biziň metodamyzyň etkinliýetini kanıtlamak üçin berilýär we empirik netijelerimiz hem biziň metodamyzyň metin klasifikasyýa hem döredijilik işlerinde döredijilik baseliniň üstüne çykarýandygyny kanıtlaýar.', 'sq': 'Building models of natural language processing (NLP) is challenging in low-resource scenarios where limited data are available.  Algoritmet e meta-mësimit të bazuar në optimizacion arrijnë rezultate premtuese në skenarë me burime të ulëta duke përshtatur një inicializim të modelit të gjeneralizuar mirë për të trajtuar detyra të reja. Megjithatë, këto qasje vuajnë nga çështja e mbipërshtatjes së kujtimit, ku modeli ka tendencë të kujtojë detyrat e metatrainimit ndërsa injoron grupet e mbështetjes kur përshtatet në detyra të reja. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një metodë imitimi të kujtesës meta-mësimi (MemIML) që përmirës on mbështetjen e modelit në grupet e mbështetjes për përshtatjen e detyrave. Veçan ërisht, ne futim një modul kujtese specifik për detyrat për të ruajtur informacionin e përcaktuar për mbështetje dhe për të ndërtuar një modul imitimi për të detyruar përcaktimin e pyetjeve për të imituar sjelljet e përcaktuara për mbështetje të ruajtura në kujtesë. Një analizë teorike është dhënë për të provuar efektshmërinë e metodës sonë dhe rezultatet empirike gjithashtu demonstrojnë se metoda jonë ekziston mbi linjat bazë konkurruese si në klasifikimin e tekstit ashtu edhe në detyrat e gjenerimit.', 'am': 'የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ (NLP) ምሳሌዎችን በመሠረት አቅራቢያ ሰዓት የተደረገ ዳታ በተገኘበት ታናሽ ክፍል ነው፡፡ ማተማር-መተማር አሌጎርቲም አዲስ ስራዎችን ለመቀበል የተስፋ ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እነዚህ ግንኙነቶች በአዲስ ስራቶች በመጠቀም ጊዜ የሚተካክሉ ማህበራዊ ትምህርት ማድረግ ስራዎችን ለማስታወስ ይጎዳሉ፡፡ ወደዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል፣ የሞዴል መታመኛውን ለመደጋገፍ ለስራ ማቀናቀል የሚያበዛውን ማስታወስ ማተማርን (MemIML) ልማድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የስራ ምርጫዎች መረጃዎችን ለማስቀመጥ እና ማሳየት እና ምርጫዎችን ለመጠየቅ የተጠቃሚ ምርጫዎችን ለመጠየቅ በተስታሰቢያ ውስጥ የተጠበቀውን የደህንነት ምርጫዎች ማሳየት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የንስቴናዊ analysis የሥርዓታችንን ጥቅም ለማረጋገጥ እና ፍሬዎችን ደግሞ የጽሑፍ መግለጫ እና ትውልድ ስርዓቶችን በማድረግ የሚቻለውን መሠረት ማሳየት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի վերամշակման մոդելների կառուցվածքը (ՆԼՊ) դժվար է ցածր ռեսուրսների սցենարներում, որտեղ հասանելի են սահմանափակ տվյալներ: Օպտիմացման հիմնված մետասովորելու ալգորիթմները հասնում են խոստացնող արդյունքներ ցածր ռեսուրսների սցենարներում՝ հարմարեցնելով լավ ընդհանուր մոդելի ինիցիալիզացիա նոր խնդիրների կառավարման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոտեցումները տառապում են հիշողության չափազանց հարմարավետ խնդիրից, որտեղ մոդելը հակված է հիշում մետա-վարժեցման խնդիրները, չնայած աջակցության համակարգերին, երբ հարմարվում է նոր խնդիրներին: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք հիշողության կրկնօրինակման մետակ, որը բարելավում է մոդելի կախվածությունը խնդիրների ադապտացիայի ադապտացիայի համակարգերի վրա: Հատկապես, մենք ներկայացնում ենք խնդիրների մասնավոր հիշողության մոդուլը, որպեսզի պահպանենք աջակցության տվյալները և կառուցենք կրկնօրինակ մոդուլը, որպեսզի ստիպենք հարցերի համակարգերը կրկնօրինակել հիշողության մեջ պահ A theoretical analysis is provided to prove the effectiveness of our method, and empirical results also demonstrate that our method outperforms competitive baselines on both text classification and generation tasks.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার মডেল নির্মাণ করছে (এনএলপি) নিম্নলিখিত সম্ভাবনায় যেখানে সীমিত তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে। Optimization-based meta-learning algorithms achieve promising results in low-resource scenarios by adapting a well-generalized model initialization to handle new tasks.  তবে এগুলো স্মৃতি প্রবাহিত হয়ে যাওয়া বিষয়টি থেকে কষ্ট পেয়েছে, যেখানে মডেলটি নতুন কাজের সাথে মেটা প্রশিক্ষণের কাজের স্মৃতি প্রদান করার সময় এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি মেমরি অনুমোদন মেটা শিক্ষার (মেমিআইএমএল) পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যা মডেলের সমর্থন সেটের উপরে মডেলের নির্ভ বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি কাজ-নির্দিষ্ট মেমরি মডিউল চিহ্নিত করি তথ্য সংরক্ষণ করার জন্য এবং স্মৃতিতে সংরক্ষণ করা সমর্থন সেটের আচরণ অনুযায়ী করার জন্য একটি অনুসন্ধান ম আমাদের পদ্ধতির কার্যকলাপ প্রমাণ করার জন্য একটি ততিত্ত্বিক বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং ক্ষমতাশালীন ফলাফল প্রমাণ করেছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি টেক্সটেক্স', 'ca': "Construir models de processament natural de llenguatges (NLP) és un repte en escenaris de baix recursos on hi ha dades limitades disponibles. Els algoritmes de meta-aprenentatge basats en l'optimització aconsegueixen resultats prometedors en escenaris de baix recursos adaptant un model ben generalitzat per gestionar noves tasques. Tot i així, aquests enfocaments pateixen el problema de la superadaptació de la memorització, on el model tendeix a memoritzar les tasques de meta-entrenament mentre ignora els conjunts de suport quan s'adapta a les noves tasques. Per abordar aquest tema, proposem un mètode de meta-aprenentatge de imitació de la memòria (MemIML) que millora la dependència del model en conjunts de suport per l'adaptació de les tasques. Specificament, introduïm un módul de memòria específic per a les tasques per emmagatzemar la informació del conjunt de suport i construir un módul de imitació per obligar els conjunts de preguntes a imitar els comportaments dels conjunts de suport emmagatzemats a la memòria. Es proporciona una anàlisi teòrica per demostrar l'eficacia del nostre mètode, i els resultats empírics també demostren que el nostre mètode supera les línies de base competitives tant en la classificació de text com en les tasques de generació.", 'az': 'Təbiətli dil işləməsi (NLP) modellərini in şa etmək çətinliklərdə çox çətinlikdir ki, müəyyən edilmiş məlumatlar faydalanır. Optimizasiya tabanlı meta öyrənmə algoritmi yeni işləri idarə etmək üçün çox generalized modeli başlanğıçlığa uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün və ’ d verən nəticələrin düşük ressurs senaryoylarına yetişir. Ancaq bu tərzlərin yeni işlərə uyğunlaşdırdığı vaxt, modeli meta-təhsil işlərini yada salmağa çalışır. Bu məs ələni çəkmək üçün, öyrənmək üçün modelinin təvəkkül qurğularının istifadəsini artırmaq üçün yaddaş imitasyonu meta-öyrənmək metodu təklif edirik. Özellikle, biz qeyd edilmiş məlumatları qorumaq üçün task-specific memory modulu təşkil edirik və məlumatları məlumatlarda qorumaq üçün bir imitasyon modulu in şa edirik. Teorik analizi metodumuzun etkinliğini kanıtlamaq üçün təmin edilir, və empirik sonuçlarımız da metin klasifikasyonu və nəsil işlərinin müqayisədə müqayisədi baz çətinlərini təsdiq edir.', 'cs': 'Vytváření modelů zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) je náročné ve scénářích s nízkými zdroji, kde jsou k dispozici omezená data. Algoritmy metaučení založené na optimalizaci dosahují slibných výsledků v scénářích s nízkými zdroji přizpůsobením dobře zobecněné inicializace modelu pro zvládnutí nových úkolů. Nicméně tyto přístupy trpí problémem zapaměťování, kdy model má tendenci si zapamatovat meta-tréninkové úkoly a ignorovat podpůrné sady při adaptaci na nové úkoly. Pro řešení této problematiky navrhujeme metodu memory imitation meta-learning (MemIML), která zvyšuje závislost modelu na sadách podpory pro adaptaci úkolů. Konkrétně představujeme paměťový modul specifický pro úlohu, který ukládá informace o podpůrné sadě a vytvoří imitační modul, který vynutí dotazové sady imitovat chování podpůrných sad uložených v paměti. Pro prokázání efektivity naší metody je provedena teoretická analýza a empirické výsledky rovněž ukazují, že naše metoda překonává konkurenční základní linie jak při klasifikaci textů, tak i generačních úlohách.', 'bs': 'Izgradavanje modela prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP) izazovno je u scenarijima niskih resursa gdje su dostupni ograničeni podaci. Algoritmi na osnovu optimizacije meta-učenja postignu obećavajuće rezultate u scenarijima niskih resursa prilagođavajući dobro generaliziranu inicijalizaciju model a za rješavanje novih zadataka. Međutim, ovi pristupi patiju od problema s prekompatiranjem memorizacije, gdje je model tendencija da se sjeti zadataka za metaobuku dok ignorišu sete podrške kada se prilagođava novim zadatacima. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo metodu imitacije memorije metaučenja (MemIML), koja povećava pouzdanost model a na sete podrške za adaptaciju zadataka. Posebno, predstavljamo specijalni modul sjećanja zadataka kako bi čuvali podršku postavljenim informacijama i izgradili imitacijski modul kako bi prisilili postavke zahtjeva da imitiraju ponašanje set a podrške koje su skladištene u sjećanju. Teoretska analiza se pruža kako bi dokazala učinkovitost naše metode, a empirički rezultati također pokazali da naša metoda nadmašuje konkurentne osnovne linije na obje zadatke za klasifikaciju teksta i generaciju.', 'et': 'Looduskeele töötlemise mudelite loomine on keeruline vähese ressursiga stsenaariumides, kus andmed on piiratud. Optimeerimispõhised metaõppe algoritmid saavutavad paljulubavaid tulemusi madala ressursiga stsenaariumides, kohandades hästi üldistatud mudeli initsialiseerimist uute ülesannete käsitlemiseks. Sellegipoolest kannatavad need lähenemisviisid meeldejätmise ülekoormamise probleemi all, kus mudel kipub meelde jätma metakoolituse ülesandeid, ignoreerides samas tugikomplekte uute ülesannetega kohanemisel. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja mälu imitatsiooni metaõppe (MemIML) meetodi, mis suurendab mudeli tuginemist ülesannete kohandamise tugikogumitele. Täpsemalt tutvustame ülesandepõhist mälumoodulit tugikomplekti teabe salvestamiseks ja loome imitatsioonimooduli, et sundida päringukomplektid imiteerima mälus salvestatud tugikomplektide käitumist. Teostatakse teoreetiline analüüs meie meetodi efektiivsuse tõestamiseks ning empiirilised tulemused näitavad ka, et meie meetod ületab konkurentsivõimelisi lähtejooni nii teksti klassifitseerimise kui ka genereerimise ülesannetes.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielenkäsittelyn mallien rakentaminen on haastavaa vähävaraisissa skenaarioissa, joissa tietoa on rajallisesti. Optimointipohjaiset meta-oppimisalgoritmit saavuttavat lupaavia tuloksia vähäresurssisissa skenaarioissa mukauttamalla hyvin yleistetyn mallin alustuksen uusiin tehtäviin. Nämä lähestymistavat kärsivät kuitenkin muistin ylisovituksesta, jossa malli yleensä muistaa meta-harjoitustehtävät unohtamatta tukijoukkoja sopeutuessaan uusiin tehtäviin. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme MemIML (Memory imitation meta-learning) -menetelmää, joka lisää mallin riippuvuutta tehtävien mukauttamisen tukijoukoista. Erityisesti esittelemme tehtäväkohtaisen muistimoduulin tukijoukkojen tietojen tallentamiseen ja rakennamme jäljitelmämoduulin pakottamaan kyselyjoukot jäljittelemään muistiin tallennettujen tukijoukkojen käyttäytymistä. Teoreettinen analyysi osoittaa menetelmämme tehokkuuden ja empiiriset tulokset osoittavat myös, että menetelmämme suoriutuu kilpailukykyisistä lähtökohdista sekä tekstiluokittelussa että generointitehtävissä.', 'jv': 'Daerah model sing dibenalke perusahaan langkung nggawe Optimisation-basic meta-Learn Algorithms success LanguagesLanguage To Address this question, we proposal a reminder imitation meta-Learning (memSML) method that emphasises the model\'s aliance on the supported settings for task modification. string" in "context_BAR_stringNew Awakdhéwé éntuk theoretik yang wis dipoleh nggawe sistem dhéwé, lan pejalaké empirhik dhéwé nggawe sistem dhéwé iso nggawe barang dhéwé basa sing perusahaan langgar sampeyan kanggo langgar sampeyan kawit kalah basa gambaran seneng dadi winih nggawe', 'ha': "An ƙiƙiro motsi na zartar da harshen aiki na natura (NLP) yana tsõratar da cikin fassarar-resource, inda za'a iya sãmun data da aka ƙayyade. Optimization-based meta-learning algorithms achieve promising results in low-resource scenarios by adapting a well-generalized model initialization to handle new tasks.  Haƙĩƙa, waɗannan hanyõyin su ana cũtar da matsayin tunãtarwa wanda za'a iya baya, a lokacin da misalin ayuka ya yi tunãni ga aikin meta-mafarin a lokacin da za'a manta taimakon su daidaita idan ana sami zuwa aikin sãbuwa. Yana buɗawa zuwa wannan masu buƙata, Muke buƙata wata shirin kwamfyuta ta taƙaita meta-leari (MIIML) da za'a ƙara kan kwamfyutan ayuka da za'a samar da tsarin ƙaranci wa aikin. Yana ƙayyade, za'a ƙunsa da modulen lokaci mai ƙayyade aikin ƙwarai don mu ƙara tsarin tsarin maɓalli kuma mu ƙiƙira modulen taƙaita dõmin ka lazimta canza tambayar ta don ya daidaita aikin ayuka masu ƙaranci da aka adana cikin kumbar. Ana yi wani littafi na teori dõmin ya gaskata masu amfani da shiryuwarmu, kuma matsalan na empiriki yana nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana samar da bakin tarayya a kan taskõkin matsayi da aikin kizafi.", 'he': 'בניית דוגמנים של עיבוד שפת טבעית (NLP) מאתגרת בתרחישים עם משאבים נמוכים שבו נתונים מוגבלים זמינים. אלגוריתמים למטה-לימוד מבוססים על אופטימיזציה מגיעים לתוצאות מבטיחות בתרחיש משאבים נמוכים על ידי שינוי ניזליזציה מודל גנרליזציה היטב כדי לטפל במשימות חדשות. למרות זאת, הגישויים האלה סובלים מהבעיה המתאימת לזיכרון, שבה המודל נוטה לזכור את משימות המטה-אימון בזמן להתעלם ממערכות תמיכה כשמתאים למשימות חדשות. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה של חיקוי זיכרון מטה-למידה (MemIML) שמגבירה את תלוייתו של המודל על קבוצות תמיכה לתאמה למשימות. במיוחד, אנחנו מציגים מודול זיכרון ספציפי למשימה כדי לאחסן מידע קבוע תמיכה ולבנות מודול חיקוי כדי לאלץ קבוצות חקירות לחקות התנהגות של קבוצות תמיכה מאוחסנות בזכרון. ניתוח תיאורטי מספק כדי להוכיח את היעילות של השיטה שלנו, ותוצאות אמפיריות גם מראות שהשיטה שלנו מגבירה את קווי הבסיס תחרותיים על שיעורי הטקסט וגם על משימות הדור.', 'sk': 'Gradnja modelov obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP) je zahtevna v scenarijih z nizkimi viri, kjer so na voljo omejeni podatki. Algoritmi metaučenja, ki temeljijo na optimizaciji, dosegajo obetavne rezultate v scenarijih z nizkimi viri s prilagoditvijo dobro posplošene inicializacije modela za obvladovanje novih nalog. Kljub temu pa ti pristopi trpijo zaradi težave s pomnilništvom, kjer model običajno zapomni naloge meta-treninga, hkrati pa ignorira nabore podpore pri prilagajanju novim nalogam. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo metodo MemIML (MemIML), ki povečuje zanašanje modela na nabore podpore za prilagajanje opravil. Natančneje predstavljamo pomnilniški modul za posamezno opravilo, ki shranjuje informacije o naboru podpore in ustvari modul za posnemanje naborov poizvedb, ki posnemajo vedenje naborov podpore, shranjenih v pomnilniku. Pripravljena je teoretična analiza, ki dokazuje učinkovitost naše metode, empirični rezultati pa tudi dokazujejo, da naša metoda presega konkurenčne osnovne črte tako pri klasifikaciji besedila kot pri nalogah generiranja.', 'bo': "རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་མིག Optimization-based meta-learning algorithms achieve promising results in low-resource scenarios by adapting a well-generalized model initialization to handle new tasks. Nonetheless, these approaches suffer from the memorization overfitting issue, where the model tends to memorize the meta-training tasks while ignoring support sets when adapting to new tasks. To address this issue, we propose a memory imitation meta-learning (MemIML) method that enhances the model's reliance on support sets for task adaptation. Specifically, we introduce a task-specific memory module to store support set information and construct an imitation module to force query sets to imitate the behaviors of support sets stored in the memory. theoretical analysis is provided to prove the effectiveness of our method, and empirical results also demonstrate that our method outperforms competitive baselines on both text classification and generation tasks."}
{'en': 'A Taxonomy of Empathetic Questions in Social Dialogs', 'es': 'Generación de paráfrasis de calidad', 'ar': 'جيل إعادة الصياغة الخاضع للرقابة', 'pt': 'Geração de paráfrases com controle de qualidade', 'fr': 'Génération de paraphrase contrôlée de qualité', 'zh': '质制释义生', 'ja': '品質管理されたパラフレーズ生成', 'hi': 'गुणवत्ता नियंत्रित व्याख्या पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Формирование парафраз с контролем качества', 'ga': 'Giniúint Athinsint Rialaithe Cáilíochta', 'ka': 'კოლეტის კონტროლური პარაფრეზის შექმნა', 'el': 'Παραγωγή παραφράσεων ελεγχόμενης ποιότητας', 'hu': 'Minőségellenőrzött parafráz-generáció', 'it': 'Generazione di parafrasi controllata di qualità', 'kk': 'Қасиетті басқару парафрасын құру', 'lt': 'Kokybės kontroliuojamų parafrazių generavimas', 'mk': 'Генерација на парафрази со контрола на квалитетот', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Parafrasa Dikawal Kualiti', 'ml': 'Quality Controlled Paraphrase Generation', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Parafrażi Kontrollata tal-Kwalità', 'mn': 'Хэрэгцээ хяналттай парафрейз үүсгэн', 'no': 'Generering av parafrasar med kvalitet kontrollert', 'pl': 'Generowanie parafraz kontrolowanych jakością', 'ro': 'Generarea parafrazei controlate de calitate', 'sr': 'Generacija parafraze kontrolirane kvalitete', 'si': 'කුළුවත් පාරප්\u200dරේස් සිදුවීම', 'so': 'Midhaha baarlamaanka', 'sv': 'Kvalitetskontrollerad parafrasgenerering', 'ta': 'தரம் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட Paraphrase உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'کیلوٹی کنٹرول پارافریز پیدائش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thế hệ phân từ ước lượng', 'bg': 'Генериране на парафрази с контролирано качество', 'da': 'Kvalitetskontrolleret parafrasegenerering', 'nl': 'Kwaliteitscontroleerde parafrasering genereren', 'hr': 'Generacija kvalitete kontrolirane parafraze', 'de': 'Qualitätsgesteuerte Paraphrasenerzeugung', 'id': 'Generasi Parafrasa Terkontrol Kualitas', 'ko': '품질 제어의 의미 생성', 'fa': 'تولید پارافریز کنترل کیفیت', 'sw': 'Ujenzi wa Paraphrase wenye sifa', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler:', 'af': 'Kwaliteit Kontroleerde Parafrase Generasie', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i Parafrazave të Kontrolluara me Kualitet', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'X√ľsusiyy…ôt Kontroll…ôndirilmiŇü Parafraz M…ôxluqatńĪ', 'bn': 'Quality Controlled Paraphrase Generation', 'bs': 'Generacija parafraze kontrolirane kvalitete', 'ca': 'Generació de parafrases controlades de qualitat', 'cs': 'Generování parafráz řízených kvalitou', 'et': 'Kvaliteedikontrollitud parafraasi genereerimine', 'fi': 'Laaduvalvotun parafraasin luominen', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje kakovosti nadzorovane parafraze', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'יצירת פראפרזיה בשליטה באיכות', 'jv': 'Job', 'bo': 'ས Quality Controlled Paraphrase Generation'}
{'en': 'Effective question asking is a crucial component of a successful conversational chatbot It could help the bots manifest empathy and render the interaction more engaging by demonstrating attention to the speaker’s emotions However current dialog generation approaches do not model this subtle emotion regulation technique due to the lack of a taxonomy of questions and their purpose in social chitchat To address this gap we have developed an empathetic question taxonomy EQT with special attention paid to questions ability to capture communicative acts and their emotion regulation intents We further design a crowd sourcing task to annotate a large subset of the EmpatheticDialogues dataset with the established labels We use the crowd annotated data to develop automatic labeling tools and produce labels for the whole dataset Finally we employ information visualization techniques to summarize co occurrences of question acts and intents and their role in regulating interlocutors emotion These results reveal important question asking strategies in social dialogs The EQT classification scheme can facilitate computational analysis of questions in datasets More importantly it can inform future efforts in empathetic question generation using neural or hybrid methods', 'pt': 'A geração de paráfrases tem sido amplamente utilizada em várias tarefas a jusante. A maioria das tarefas se beneficia principalmente de paráfrases de alta qualidade, ou seja, aquelas que são semanticamente semelhantes, mas linguisticamente diferentes da sentença original. Gerar paráfrases de alta qualidade é um desafio, pois se torna cada vez mais difícil preservar o significado à medida que a diversidade linguística aumenta. Trabalhos recentes alcançam bons resultados ao controlar aspectos específicos da paráfrase, como sua árvore sintática. No entanto, eles não permitem controlar diretamente a qualidade da paráfrase gerada, e sofrem com baixa flexibilidade e escalabilidade. Aqui propomos o QCPG, um modelo de geração de paráfrases controladas guiadas pela qualidade, que permite controlar diretamente as dimensões da qualidade. Além disso, sugerimos um método que, dada uma sentença, identifica pontos no espaço de controle de qualidade que devem produzir paráfrases geradas ótimas. Mostramos que nosso método é capaz de gerar paráfrases que mantêm o significado original e alcançam maior diversidade do que a linha de base não controlada. Os modelos, o código e os dados podem ser encontrados em https://github.com/IBM/quality-control-paraphrase-generation.', 'ar': 'تم استخدام إعادة الصياغة على نطاق واسع في العديد من المهام النهائية. تستفيد معظم المهام بشكل أساسي من إعادة صياغة عالية الجودة ، أي تلك التي تشبه لغويًا الجملة الأصلية ، ولكنها متنوعة لغويًا عنها. يعد إنشاء إعادة صياغة عالية الجودة أمرًا صعبًا حيث يصبح من الصعب بشكل متزايد الحفاظ على المعنى مع زيادة التنوع اللغوي. تحقق الأعمال الحديثة نتائج جيدة من خلال التحكم في جوانب معينة من إعادة الصياغة ، مثل الشجرة النحوية الخاصة بها. ومع ذلك ، فهي لا تسمح بالتحكم المباشر في جودة إعادة الصياغة التي تم إنشاؤها ، وتعاني من ضعف المرونة وقابلية التوسع. هنا نقترح QCPG ، نموذج إنشاء إعادة صياغة يتم التحكم فيه بتوجيه الجودة ، والذي يسمح بالتحكم المباشر في أبعاد الجودة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقترح طريقة تعطى جملة تحدد النقاط في مساحة مراقبة الجودة التي من المتوقع أن تسفر عن إعادة صياغة مثالية تم إنشاؤها. نظهر أن طريقتنا قادرة على إنشاء إعادة صياغة تحافظ على المعنى الأصلي مع تحقيق تنوع أعلى من خط الأساس غير المنضبط. يمكن العثور على النماذج والكود والبيانات في https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'es': 'La generación de paráfrasis se ha utilizado ampliamente en varias tareas posteriores. La mayoría de las tareas se benefician principalmente de paráfrasis de alta calidad, es decir, aquellas que son semánticamente similares a la oración original, pero lingüísticamente diversas de la oración original. Generar paráfrasis de alta calidad es un desafío, ya que cada vez es más difícil preservar el significado a medida que aumenta la diversidad Los trabajos recientes logran buenos resultados al controlar aspectos específicos de la paráfrasis, como su árbol sintáctico. Sin embargo, no permiten controlar directamente la calidad de la paráfrasis generada, y adolecen de poca flexibilidad y escalabilidad. Aquí proponemos QCPG, un modelo de generación de paráfrasis controlada guiado por la calidad, que permite controlar directamente las dimensiones de calidad. Además, sugerimos un método que, dada una oración, identifica puntos en el espacio de control de calidad que se espera que produzcan paráfrasis generadas óptimas. Demostramos que nuestro método es capaz de generar paráfrasis que mantienen el significado original mientras se logra una mayor diversidad que la línea de base no controlada. Los modelos, el código y los datos se pueden encontrar en https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'fr': "La génération de paraphrase a été largement utilisée dans diverses tâches en aval. La plupart des tâches bénéficient principalement de paraphrases de haute qualité, à savoir celles qui sont sémantiquement similaires à la phrase originale, mais qui diffèrent linguistiquement de celle-ci. Il est difficile de générer des paraphrases de haute qualité car il devient de plus en plus difficile de préserver le sens à mesure que la diversité linguistique Des travaux récents donnent de bons résultats en contrôlant des aspects spécifiques de la paraphrase, tels que son arbre syntaxique. Cependant, ils ne permettent pas de contrôler directement la qualité de la paraphrase générée, et souffrent d'une flexibilité et d'une évolutivité faibles. Nous proposons ici QCPG, un modèle de génération de paraphrase contrôlée guidée par la qualité, qui permet de contrôler directement les dimensions de qualité. De plus, nous suggérons une méthode qui, en fonction d'une phrase, identifie les points dans l'espace de contrôle qualité qui sont censés produire des paraphrases générées de manière optimale. Nous montrons que notre méthode est capable de générer des paraphrases qui conservent le sens original tout en obtenant une plus grande diversité que la base non contrôlée. Les modèles, le code et les données se trouvent sur https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'ru': 'Генерация перефразов широко используется в различных задачах ниже по потоку. Большинство задач выигрывают в основном от высококачественных парафразов, а именно тех, которые семантически похожи, но лингвистически отличаются от исходного предложения. Генерация высококачественных перефразов является сложной задачей, поскольку становится все труднее сохранить значение по мере увеличения языкового разнообразия. Недавние работы достигают приятных результатов, контролируя конкретные аспекты перефразирования, такие как его синтаксическое дерево. Однако они не позволяют напрямую контролировать качество сгенерированного перефраза, а также страдают низкой гибкостью и масштабируемостью. Здесь мы предлагаем QCPG, управляемую по качеству модель генерации парафраз, которая позволяет непосредственно контролировать измерения качества. Кроме того, мы предлагаем метод, который задает предложение, идентифицирует точки в пространстве контроля качества, которые, как ожидается, дадут оптимальные сгенерированные перефразы. Мы показываем, что наш метод способен генерировать парафразы, которые сохраняют первоначальное значение при достижении большего разнообразия, чем неконтролируемая базовая линия. Модели, код и данные можно найти в https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'zh': '释义生成已博施于百务。 大抵受益于高质量者释义,语义与始句相似而言语异释义也。 生高质量者释义有挑战性,因言多样性增益,留义转难。 近制释义之特定(如其句法树)不爽。 然其不许直制生成之释义,而有轻灵活性可伸缩性。 于此立QCPG,一以受控释义为质,许直制其维度。 又建议一法,出一句,别制空中,望生最佳释义。 吾道生释义,比不受制之基线多样性。 模、代码、数可得于 https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation 中。', 'ja': 'パラフレーズ生成は、様々な下流タスクで広く使用されています。 ほとんどのタスクは、主に高品質のパラフレーズ、すなわち、意味的に類似しているが、元の文章から言語的に多様なものから恩恵を受ける。 言語の多様性が増すにつれて意味を保つことがますます困難になるため、高品質のパラフレーズを生成することは困難です。 最近の研究では、構文木などのパラフレーズの特定の側面を制御することで、良い結果を得ることができます。 ただし、生成されたパラフレーズの品質を直接制御することはできず、柔軟性とスケーラビリティの低さに苦しんでいます。 ここでは、品質寸法を直接制御できる品質誘導型パラフレーズ生成モデルであるQCPGを提案します。 さらに、文を与えれば、最適なパラフレーズを生成することが期待される品質管理空間内のポイントを識別する方法を提案する。 我々の方法は、制御されていないベースラインよりも高い多様性を達成しながら、元の意味を維持するパラフレーズを生成することができることを示しています。 モデル、コード、およびデータは、https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generationにあります。', 'hi': 'विभिन्न डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों में व्यापक रूप से अनुवाद पीढ़ी का उपयोग किया गया है। अधिकांश कार्य मुख्य रूप से उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले व्याख्याओं से लाभान्वित होते हैं, अर्थात् वे जो मूल वाक्य से शब्दार्थ के समान हैं, फिर भी भाषाई रूप से विविध हैं। उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले पैराफ्रेज़ उत्पन्न करना चुनौतीपूर्ण है क्योंकि भाषाई विविधता बढ़ने के साथ अर्थ को संरक्षित करना तेजी से कठिन हो जाता है। हाल के कार्यों को इसके वाक्यात्मक पेड़ जैसे व्याख्या के विशिष्ट पहलुओं को नियंत्रित करके अच्छे परिणाम प्राप्त होते हैं। हालांकि, वे सीधे उत्पन्न व्याख्या की गुणवत्ता को नियंत्रित करने की अनुमति नहीं देते हैं, और कम लचीलेपन और स्केलेबिलिटी से पीड़ित हैं। यहां हम QCPG, एक गुणवत्ता-निर्देशित नियंत्रित पैराफ्रेज़ जनरेशन मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो सीधे गुणवत्ता आयामों को नियंत्रित करने की अनुमति देता है। इसके अलावा, हम एक ऐसी विधि का सुझाव देते हैं जो एक वाक्य दिया गया है, गुणवत्ता नियंत्रण स्थान में बिंदुओं की पहचान करता है जो इष्टतम उत्पन्न किए गए पैराफ्रेज़ उत्पन्न करने की उम्मीद करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी विधि पैराफ्रेज़ उत्पन्न करने में सक्षम है जो अनियंत्रित आधार रेखा की तुलना में उच्च विविधता प्राप्त करते हुए मूल अर्थ को बनाए रखती है। मॉडल, कोड, और डेटा https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation में पाया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Baineadh úsáid fhorleathan as giniúint athinsint i dtascanna éagsúla iartheachtacha. Baineann an chuid is mó de na tascanna leas as athróga ardchaighdeáin, is iad sin na cinn atá cosúil go séimeantach leis an abairt bhunaidh ach atá éagsúil ó thaobh na teanga de. Tá sé dúshlánach athinsint ardchaighdeáin a ghiniúint mar go mbíonn sé ag éirí níos deacra an bhrí a chaomhnú de réir mar a mhéadaíonn éagsúlacht teanga. Baineann saothair le déanaí torthaí deasa amach trí ghnéithe sonracha den athinsint a rialú, amhail a chrann comhréire. Mar sin féin, ní cheadaíonn siad cáilíocht an athinsinte a ghintear a rialú go díreach, agus tá siad ag fulaingt ó sholúbthacht íseal agus scalability. Molaimid anseo QCPG, samhail giniúna athinsinte rialaithe cáilíochta-treoraithe, a cheadaíonn na toisí cáilíochta a rialú go díreach. Ina theannta sin, molaimid modh a thugann abairt, a shainaithníonn pointí sa spás rialaithe cáilíochta a mbeifear ag súil leis go n-eascróidh na parafrása barrmhaithe ginte. Léirímid go bhfuil ár modh in ann parafrása a ghiniúint a choinníonn an bhunchiall agus ag an am céanna éagsúlacht níos airde a bhaint amach ná an bhunlíne neamhrialaithe. Is féidir na samhlacha, an cód, agus na sonraí a fháil in https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'el': 'Η παραγωγή παραφράσεων έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί ευρέως σε διάφορες μεταγενέστερες εργασίες. Οι περισσότερες εργασίες επωφελούνται κυρίως από τις υψηλής ποιότητας παραφράσεις, δηλαδή εκείνες που είναι σημασιολογικά παρόμοιες, αλλά γλωσσικά διαφορετικές από την αρχική πρόταση. Η δημιουργία υψηλής ποιότητας παραφράσεων αποτελεί πρόκληση καθώς γίνεται όλο και πιο δύσκολο να διατηρηθεί το νόημα καθώς αυξάνεται η γλωσσική πολυμορφία. Πρόσφατα έργα επιτυγχάνουν ωραία αποτελέσματα ελέγχοντας συγκεκριμένες πτυχές της παραφράσης, όπως το συντακτικό της δέντρο. Ωστόσο, δεν επιτρέπουν τον άμεσο έλεγχο της ποιότητας της παραγόμενης παραφράσης και υποφέρουν από χαμηλή ευελιξία και επεκτασιμότητα. Εδώ προτείνουμε ένα ποιοτικό ελεγχόμενο μοντέλο παραγωγής παραφράσεων, το οποίο επιτρέπει τον άμεσο έλεγχο των ποιοτικών διαστάσεων. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο που δεδομένης μιας πρότασης, προσδιορίζει σημεία στον χώρο ελέγχου ποιότητας που αναμένεται να αποφέρουν βέλτιστες παράγωγες παραφράσεις. Δείχνουμε ότι η μέθοδος μας είναι σε θέση να παράγει παραφράσεις που διατηρούν το αρχικό νόημα ενώ επιτυγχάνουν μεγαλύτερη ποικιλομορφία από την ανεξέλεγκτη γραμμή βάσης. Τα μοντέλα, ο κώδικας και τα δεδομένα μπορούν να βρεθούν στο https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'hu': 'A parafráz generálását széles körben használják különböző downstream feladatokban. A legtöbb feladat elsősorban kiváló minőségű parafrázisokból származik, nevezetesen azokból, amelyek szemantikailag hasonlóak az eredeti mondathoz, de nyelvileg eltérnek attól. Kiváló minőségű parafrázisok létrehozása kihívást jelent, mivel a nyelvi sokszínűség növekedésével egyre nehezebbé válik a jelentés megőrzése. A közelmúltbeli munkák szép eredményeket érnek el a parafrázis konkrét aspektusainak ellenőrzésével, mint például a szintaktikus fa. Azonban nem teszik lehetővé a generált parafráz minőségének közvetlen ellenőrzését, és alacsony rugalmasságot és skálázhatóságot szenvednek. Itt javasoljuk a QCPG-t, egy minőség-vezérelt parafráz generációs modellt, amely lehetővé teszi a minőségi dimenziók közvetlen ellenőrzését. Továbbá olyan módszert javaslunk, amely adott mondatot ad, azonosítja azokat a pontokat a minőségellenőrzési területen, amelyek várhatóan optimális parafrázist eredményeznek. Megmutatjuk, hogy módszerünk olyan parafrázisokat képes generálni, amelyek megtartják az eredeti jelentést, miközben nagyobb diverzitást érnek el, mint az ellenőrizetlen alap. A modellek, a kód és az adatok a következő oldalon találhatók: https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ka': 'პარაფრაზესების განვითარებით განსხვავებული დავალებში გამოყენებულია. უფრო მეტი დავალებები უფრო დიდი კალგატიური პარაფრაზებიდან გამოიყენებენ, რომელიც სიმენტიურად განსხვავებულია, მაგრამ ენგურილისურად განსხვავებულია, ორიგინალ უფრო მაღალური პარაფრაზების შექმნა უფრო რთული იქნება, რადგან უფრო რთული იქნება, რომ მნიშვნელობის შექმნა, როგორც ლენგურისტიკური განსხვავება უფრო მიმდინარე სამუშაო სამუშაო წარმოდგენა, როგორც სამუშაო სინტაქტიური ხე. მაგრამ, ისინი არ შეუძლებელია განვითარებული პარაფრაზესის კოლეტაციის კოლეტაციას დარწმუნდოთ და მარცხოვრებულობაზე. აქ ჩვენ QCPG-ს წყველავთ, რომელიც კონტროლურად გავაკეთებული პარაფრაზეზების მოდელს, რომელიც განხორციელად კონტროლურად კონტროლურად გავაკეთ დამატებით, ჩვენ მინდომებით მეტი, რომელიც წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენა, განსაზღვრავს წარმოდგენების კონტროლური ადგილაში, რომელიც უნდა იქნება ოპტიმალური და ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი შეუძლია პარაფრაზების შექმნა, რომლებიც ორიგინალური ნიშნავს, რომლებიც უფრო მეტი განსხვავებას მიიღებთ, ვიდრე უფრო მოდელები, კოდის და მონაცემების შესაძლებელია https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'it': "La generazione di parafrasi è stata ampiamente utilizzata in vari compiti a valle. La maggior parte dei compiti beneficiano principalmente di parafrase di alta qualità, vale a dire quelle semanticamente simili, ma linguisticamente diverse, alla frase originale. Generare parafrasi di alta qualità è difficile in quanto diventa sempre più difficile preservare il significato con l'aumentare della diversità linguistica. I lavori recenti raggiungono buoni risultati controllando aspetti specifici della parafrasi, come il suo albero sintattico. Tuttavia, non consentono di controllare direttamente la qualità della parafrasi generata e soffrono di bassa flessibilità e scalabilità. Qui proponiamo QCPG, un modello di generazione di parafrasi controllati guidato dalla qualità, che permette di controllare direttamente le dimensioni di qualità. Inoltre, suggeriamo un metodo che, data una frase, identifica punti nello spazio di controllo qualità che ci si aspetta di produrre parafrasi generate ottimali. Dimostriamo che il nostro metodo è in grado di generare parafrasi che mantengono il significato originale pur raggiungendo una maggiore diversità rispetto alla base incontrollata. I modelli, il codice e i dati possono essere trovati in https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'lt': 'Parafrazių sukūrimas buvo plačiai naudojamas įvairioms tolesnėms užduotims. Dauguma užduočių daugiausia pasinaudoja aukštos kokybės parafrazėmis, būtent tomis, kurios semantiškai panašios į pradinį sakinį, tačiau kalbiniu požiūriu skiriasi nuo jo. Aukštos kokybės parafrazių kūrimas yra sunkus, nes vis sunkiau išsaugoti reikšmę didėjant kalbų įvairovei. Neseniai atliktų darbų rezultatai gerai pasiekiami kontroliuojant konkrečius parafrazės aspektus, pavyzdžiui, sintaksinį medį. Tačiau jos neleidžia tiesiogiai kontroliuoti sukauptos parafrazės kokybės ir kenčia nuo nedidelio lankstumo ir mastingumo. Here we propose QCPG, a quality-guided controlled paraphrase generation model, that allows directly controlling the quality dimensions.  Be to, siūlome taikyti metodą, pagal kurį būtų nustatytas sakinys, nustatantis kokybės kontrolės erdvės taškus, kurie, kaip tikimasi, duos optimalių sukauptų parafrazių. Mes parodome, kad mūsų metodas gali sukurti parafrazes, kurios išlaiko pradinę reikšmę ir kartu užtikrina didesnę įvairovę nei nekontroliuojama bazė. Modeliai, kodas ir duomenys pateikiami https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'kk': 'Парафразды құру көбірек төменгі тапсырмаларда көбірек қолданылды. Көпшілігі тапсырмалардың көпшілігі негізінде сапа сапа парфразтарынан шығарылады, бұл - семантикалық сияқты, бірақ тілдік тілдігінен басқа түрлі сөз. Жоғары сапалық парафразтарды құру үшін мәліметті лингвистикалық әртүрлі күшейтіндей сақтау үшін көп қиын болады. Жуырдағы жұмыстар парафраздың ерекше бөлшектерін, мысалы, синтактикалық бұтақтарын бақылап, жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізеді. Бірақ олар құрылған парафраздың сапасын тікелей басқаруға рұқсат бермейді. Бірақ бұл парафраздың сапасын өзгертуге рұқсат бермейді. Бірақ олар өзге Мұнда біз QCPG дегенді, сапатты бағытталған парафраз құру үлгісін, сапатты өлшемдерді тікелей басқаруға мүмкіндік береді. Сонымен қатар, біз сөйлем берілген әдісін таңдаймыз, сапатты басқару орындағы нүктелерді таңдаймыз. Бұл парафразтарды оптималдық құрылған парафразтарды таңдайды. Біз әдіміздің бастапқы мәліметті құру үшін бастапқы мәліметті жеткізетін парафразтарды құру мүмкіндігін көрсетедік. Үлгілер, код және деректер https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ms': 'Generasi parafrasa telah digunakan secara luas dalam pelbagai tugas turun. Kebanyakan tugas berguna terutama dari parafrasa kualiti tinggi, iaitu yang secara semantik sama dengan, namun secara bahasa berbeza dari, kalimat asal. Menjana parafrasa kualiti tinggi adalah menantang kerana ia semakin sukar untuk menyimpan makna semasa kebanyakan bahasa meningkat. Kerja baru-baru ini mencapai keputusan yang baik dengan mengawal aspek khusus parafrasa, seperti pokok sintaktik. Namun, mereka tidak membenarkan untuk mengawal secara langsung kualiti parafrasa yang dijana, dan menderita fleksibiliti dan skalabiliti rendah. Di sini kita cadangkan QCPG, model generasi parafrasa kawalan kualiti yang membolehkan mengawal dimensi kualiti secara langsung. Selain itu, kami cadangkan kaedah yang diberikan kalimat, mengenalpasti titik dalam ruang kawalan kualiti yang dijangka untuk menghasilkan parafrasa yang diciptakan optimal. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami mampu menghasilkan parafrasa yang menyimpan makna asal sementara mencapai kebanyakan yang lebih tinggi daripada asal yang tidak dikendalikan. Model, kod, dan data boleh ditemui https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'mk': 'Генерацијата на парафрази е широко употребена во различни задачи на потекло. Повеќето задачи користат главно од висококвалитетни парафрази, имено оние кои семантично се слични на оригиналната реченица, но сепак јазички различни од неа. Генерацијата на висококвалитетни парафрази е предизвикувачка бидејќи станува сé тешко да се зачува значењето додека се зголемува јазичната различност. Неодамнешните дела постигнуваат убави резултати со контрола на специфичните аспекти на парафразата, како што е нејзиното синтактичко дрво. Сепак, тие не дозволуваат директна контрола на квалитетот на генерираната парафраза и страдаат од ниска флексибилност и скалабилност. Овде предложуваме QCPG, модел за контролирана генерација на парафрази, кој овозможува директно контролирање на квалитетните димензии. Покрај тоа, предлагаме метод кој дава реченица, идентификува точки во квалитетниот контролен простор кои се очекува да дадат оптимални генерирани парафрази. Ние покажуваме дека нашиот метод е способен да генерира парафрази кои го одржуваат оригиналното значење, при што постигнуваат повисока различност од неконтролираната основа. Моделите, кодот и податоците се наоѓаат во https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ml': 'പാരാഫ്രസ് തലമുറകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലികള്\u200d ഉയരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപകരിക്കുന്നു. അതായത് സെമാന്റിക്കല ഉയരത്തിലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് വിലപിടിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ടാണ്. ഭാഷ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്ക അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്നത് പാരാഫ്രെയിസ്റ്റിക്ക് വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക വിഭാ എന്നാലും സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാരാഫ്രെയിസ്റ്റിന്റെ ഗുണവും നേരിട്ട് നിയന്ത്രിക്കാന്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് അനുവദിക്കില്ല ഇവിടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക്യൂസിപിജിയെ നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഗുണപ്രകാരം നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാരാഫ്രേസ് തലമുറയുടെ മോഡല അതിനുശേഷം, വാക്ക് നല്\u200dകുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നാം നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, സാധാരണ നിയന്ത്രണസ്ഥലത്തിലുള്ള പോയിന്റുകള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷി നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ബേസ്ലൈനെക്കാള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്ന വ്യത്യാസം പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്ര മോഡല്\u200d, കോഡ്, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'mn': 'Парафрейз үеийнх нь олон доорх үйл ажиллагаанд ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгдсэн. Ихэнх үйл ажиллагаанууд ихэвчлэн өндөр чанартай парафразуудын тухай ашигладаг. Энэ нь хэл хэлэлцээс өөр өөр, эхний өгүүлбэр. Өндөр чанартай парафрейз бий болгох нь хэлний олон янз бүрийг нэмэгдүүлэхэд илүү хэцүү болж байна. Саяхан ажиллах нь сайхан үр дүн гарч ирнэ. Үүний шинжлэх ухааны модны тодорхой хэсгийг удирдаж байдаг. Гэвч тэд үүсгэсэн параграфын чанарыг шууд удирдах боломжгүй, бага урсгалын, магадлалын чанараас зовлон байдаг. Энд бид QCPG-г санал болгож байна. Энэ нь чанарын хэмжээсүүдийг шууд удирдах боломжтой. Мөн бид өгүүлбэр өгсөн аргыг тайлбарлаж чадах качествен удирдлагын орон зайд цэгүүдийг тодорхойлдог. Бид өөрсдийнхөө арга нь эхний утгыг хадгалах хэлбэрүүдийг гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Загвар, код, өгөгдлийг олж болно. https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni tal-parafrażijiet intużat b’mod wiesa’ f’diversi kompiti downstream. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-kompiti jibbenefikaw prinċipalment minn parafrażijiet ta’ kwalità għolja, jiġifieri dawk li huma semantikament simili għal, iżda lingwistikament differenti mis-sentenza oriġinali. Il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ parafrażijiet ta’ kwalità għolja hija ta’ sfida peress li jsir dejjem aktar diffiċli li jiġi ppreservat it-tifsira hekk kif tiżdied id-diversità lingwistika. Ix-xogħlijiet reċenti jiksbu riżultati tajbin billi jikkontrollaw aspetti speċifiċi tal-parafrażi, bħas-siġar sintetiku tiegħu. Madankollu, ma jippermettux li jikkontrollaw direttament il-kwalità tal-parafrażi ġġenerata, u jbatu minn flessibbiltà u skalabilità baxxa. Hawnhekk nipproponu QCPG, mudell ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ parafrażi kkontrollata mmexxi fuq il-kwalità, li jippermetti l-kontroll dirett tad-dimensjonijiet tal-kwalità. Barra minn hekk, jissuġġerixxu metodu li jagħti sentenza, jidentifika punti fl-ispazju tal-kontroll tal-kwalità li huma mistennija jagħtu parafrażijiet iġġenerati ottimali. Aħna nuru li l-metodu tagħna huwa kapaċi jiġġenera parafrażijiet li jżommu t-tifsira oriġinali filwaqt li jiksbu diversità ogħla mil-linja bażi mhux ikkontrollata. The models, the code, and the data can be found in  https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'pl': 'Generowanie parafraz jest szeroko stosowane w różnych dalszych zadaniach. Większość zadań korzysta głównie z wysokiej jakości parafraz, a mianowicie tych, które są semantycznie podobne, ale językowo różniące się od oryginalnego zdania. Generowanie wysokiej jakości parafraz jest wyzwaniem, ponieważ coraz trudniej jest zachować znaczenie wraz ze wzrostem różnorodności językowej. Ostatnie prace osiągają ładne rezultaty kontrolując konkretne aspekty parafrazy, takie jak drzewo składni. Nie pozwalają one jednak bezpośrednio kontrolować jakości generowanej parafrazy i cierpią z powodu niskiej elastyczności i skalowalności. Tutaj proponujemy QCPG, sterowany jakościowo model generowania parafraz, który pozwala bezpośrednio kontrolować wymiary jakości. Ponadto proponujemy metodę, która podaje zdanie, identyfikuje punkty w przestrzeni kontroli jakości, które mają dać optymalnie generowane parafrazy. Pokazujemy, że nasza metoda jest w stanie generować parafrazy, które zachowują oryginalne znaczenie przy jednoczesnym osiągnięciu większej różnorodności niż niekontrolowana baza. Modele, kod i dane można znaleźć w https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ro': 'Generarea de parafraze a fost utilizată pe scară largă în diverse sarcini din aval. Majoritatea sarcinilor beneficiază în principal de parafraze de înaltă calitate, și anume cele care sunt semantic similare cu propoziția inițială, dar diferite lingvistic de aceasta. Generarea parafrazelor de înaltă calitate este o provocare deoarece devine din ce în ce mai greu să păstrezi sensul pe măsură ce diversitatea lingvistică crește. Lucrările recente obțin rezultate frumoase controlând aspecte specifice ale parafrazei, cum ar fi arborele sintactic. Cu toate acestea, ele nu permit controlul direct al calității parafrazei generate și suferă de flexibilitate scăzută și scalabilitate. Aici propunem QCPG, un model de generare a parafrazei controlate, ghidat de calitate, care permite controlul direct al dimensiunilor calitatii. Mai mult, sugerăm o metodă care, dată fiind o propoziție, identifică punctele din spațiul de control al calității care sunt de așteptat să producă parafraze optime generate. Noi arătăm că metoda noastră este capabilă să genereze parafraze care mențin sensul inițial, obținând în același timp o diversitate mai mare decât baza necontrolată. Modelele, codul și datele pot fi găsite în https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'no': 'Generasjon av parafraser er breidd brukt i ulike nedstrekkoppgåver. Dei fleste oppgåver nyttar hovudsakelig frå høg kvalitetsprogrammer, i tillegg dei som er semantisk liknande, men språk forskjellig frå originalen. Det er vanskeleg å laga høgkvalitetsfarafrasar, sidan det blir vanskeleg å beholda mening som språkstisk mangfoldighet øker. Nyleg oppnår arbeida nokre god resultat ved å kontrollera spesifikke aspektar av parafrasen, slik som syntaktiske tre. Dei kan imidlertid ikkje kontrollera kvaliteten til den genererte parafrasen direkte, og levera frå låg fleksibilitet og skalabilitet. Her foreslår vi QCPG, eit kontrollert parafrase-genereringsmodell med kvalitetstyring, som tillater direkte kontrollere kvalitetdimensjonane. I tillegg foreslår vi eit metode som gjev eit setning, identifiserer punkt i kvalitetskontrollrommet som ventar å gje optimalt genererte parafrasar. Vi viser at metoden vårt er i stand til å laga parafrasar som vedlikehald den opprinnelige meningen medan det gjer høgare mangfoldigheten enn den ukontrollerte grunnlinja. Modellene, koden og dataene finn i https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'sr': 'Generacija parafraza je široko korišćena u različitim zadacima. Većina zadataka koristi uglavnom od visoke kvalitetne parafraze, a to su oni koji su semantički slični, a ipak jezički različiti od originalne rečenice. Generiranje visokokvalitetnih parafraza je izazovno jer postaje sve teže čuvati smisao dok se povećava jezička raznolikost. Nedavni rad postiže dobar rezultat kontroliranjem specifičnih aspekta parafraze, poput sintaktičkog drveta. Međutim, oni ne dozvoljavaju da direktno kontrolišu kvalitet proizvedene parafraze i pati od niske fleksibilnosti i skalabilnosti. Ovdje predlažemo QCPG, model generacije parafraza koji omogućava direktno kontrolirati dimenzije kvalitete. Nadalje, predlažemo metodu koja je dala rečenicu, identifikuje tačke u prostoru za kontrolu kvalitete koji se očekuje da će doneti optimalne generirane parafraze. Pokazujemo da je naša metoda sposobna da stvori parafraze koje održavaju originalno značenje dok postignemo veće raznolikosti od nekontroliranog početnog linije. Modeli, kod i podaci se nalaze u https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'so': "Qarniga Paraphrase waxaa lagu isticmaalay hawlo badan oo webiga ka hooseeya. Shaqooyinka badankoodu waxey si badan uga faa'iidaan qeybaha takhasuska ah, kuwaas oo ah kuwa u eg sida sinnaanta, laakiin luuqadda ku kala duwan yihiin hadalka asalka ah. Muujinta qalabka qiimaha sare waa dhibaatooyin, sababtoo ah waxay ku adag tahay in la ilaaliyo macnaheedu ay kordhiso kala duduwan luuqadaha. Shaqooyinka ugu dambeeyay waxay heli karaan resulto wanaagsan marka lagu maamulo dhinaca gaarka ah ee isku xiran, tusaale ahaan geedkiisa syntactic. Si kastaba ha ahaatee uma oggolaan inay toos u maamulaan qiimaha muuqashada, waxayna ku xanuunsadaan caqli yar iyo caqli yar. Halkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa QCPG, model qaab la taliyey oo la taliyey isku mid ah, kaas oo si toos ah u ilaalinaya qaybaha qiimaha. Furthermore, we suggest a method that given a sentence, identifies points in the quality control space that are expected to yield optimal generated paraphrases.  Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababkayagu awoodi karo inuu abuuro marxalada asalka ah oo xajiya micneheeda asalka ah marka uu gaadho kala duwanaansho ka sarreeya qoraalka aan la xiriirin. Tusaalada, sumadda iyo macluumaadka waxaa laga heli karaa https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'sv': 'Parafrasgenerering har använts i stor utsträckning i olika nedströmsuppgifter. De flesta uppgifter gynnas huvudsakligen av högkvalitativa parafraser, dvs. de som semantiskt liknar, men språkligt skiljer sig från, den ursprungliga meningen. Att skapa högkvalitativa parafraser är utmanande eftersom det blir allt svårare att bevara mening i takt med att språklig mångfald ökar. Nya verk uppnår fina resultat genom att kontrollera specifika aspekter av parafrasen, såsom dess syntaktiska träd. De tillåter dock inte direkt att kontrollera kvaliteten på den genererade parafrasen och lider av låg flexibilitet och skalbarhet. Här föreslår vi QCPG, en kvalitetsstyrd, kontrollerad parafrasgenereringsmodell, som möjliggör direkt kontroll av kvalitetsdimensionerna. Dessutom föreslår vi en metod som ger en mening, identifierar punkter i kvalitetskontrollutrymmet som förväntas ge optimala genererade parafraser. Vi visar att vår metod kan generera parafraser som bibehåller den ursprungliga innebörden samtidigt som den uppnår högre mångfald än den okontrollerade baslinjen. Modellerna, koden och data finns i https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'si': 'විවිධ වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරභාව ප්\u200dරභාව ප්\u200dරභාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ. ගොඩක් වැඩක් වැඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒත් භාෂාවික වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, මු විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ කරනවා මොකද ඒක විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේ අලුත් වැඩේ හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති නමුත්, ඔවුන් නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ, සහ අඩුව මෙතන අපි QCPG ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, ප්\u200dරතිශේෂතාව පාරප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පාරප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පාරප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පාර ඉතින්, අපි වාක්යයක් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පාරප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා කියලා බලාපොරො අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරවේශයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තියෙන්නේ මුලින් අදහසක් තියෙන මොඩේල්, කෝඩ්, දත්ත හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ta': 'Paraphrase generation has been widely used in various downstream tasks. பெரும்பாலான செயல்கள் உயர்தரமான சொற்றொடர்களிலிருந்து முக்கியமாக பயன்படுத்துகிறது, அதாவது போன்ற மொழியில் இருந்தும் மொழியி உயர்தரமான அளபுருக்களை உருவாக்குவது சவாலாகும் ஏனெனில் அது மொழியின் பல்வேறு வித்தியாசம் அதிகரிக்கும் பொருளால் அது  அண்மையில் செயல்கள் சிறந்த முடிவுகளை கட்டுப்படுத்தி அளபுருவின் குறிப்பிட்ட பகுதிகளை கட்டுப்படுத்தும், அது ஒ ஆனால், அவர்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சொற்றொடரின் தரமை நேரடியாக கட்டுப்படுத்த அனுமதிக்க மாட்டார்கள், மற்றும் குறைவான சூழல்  இங்கே நாம் QCPG, ஒரு தரம்- நேர்வழி கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட சொற்றொடர் உருவாக்கி மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது தரம் பரிமா Furthermore, we suggest a method that given a sentence, identifies points in the quality control space that are expected to yield optimal generated paraphrases.  நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் நம் முறைமையில் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்படாத அடிக்கோட்டை விட அதிக வேறுபாடுகளை உருவாக்க முடியும். மாதிரி, குறியீடு, மற்றும் தகவல் கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ur': 'پارافریز کی نسل مختلف نیچے کاموں میں وسیع طور پر استعمال کی گئی ہے. اکثر کاروباروں کی عمدہ میں اچھی کیفیت پارافریز سے فائدہ اٹھائے جاتے ہیں، یعنی وہ جن کے مطابق سمنتی طور پر ہیں، لیکن زبان کے مطابق اصلی کلام سے مختلف ہیں. بلند کیفیت پارافریز پیدا کرنے کا مشکل ہے کیونکہ اس کا مطلب زیادہ سخت ہوتا ہے جیسے زبان کی مختلف زیادہ بڑھتا ہے۔ اچھے کاموں کو اچھے نتیجے پہنچاتے ہیں کہ پارافریز کے مخصوص اندازے کنٹرول کریں، جیسے اس کے سینٹکتیک درخت۔ لیکن ان کی اجازت نہیں ہے کہ پیدا کئے ہوئے پارافریز کے کیفیت کو مستقیم کنترل کریں اور کم ہلکت اور ترازوئی سے رنج لیں۔ یہاں ہم QCPG کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک کیفیت کی ہدایت کی کنٹرول کی پارافریز پیدائش موڈل، جو سیدھی کیفیت کی اندازیوں کو کنٹرول کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ایک جماعت دی گئی ہے، کیفیت کنٹرول جگہ کی پوینٹوں کو پہچان دیتا ہے جو انتظار کی جاتی ہے کہ اچھی طریقہ پیدا کئے جائیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ پارافریز پیدا کرسکتا ہے جو اصلی معنی کو حفاظت کرتی ہے اور اس سے زیادہ متفاوت حاصل کرتی ہے۔ نمڈل، کوڈ، اور ڈیٹا اس میں پا سکتے ہیں https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'uz': "Name Most tasks benefit mainly from high quality paraphrases, namely those that are semantically similar to, yet linguistically diverse from, the original sentence.  @ info: whatsthis Yaqinda ishlar yaxshi natijalarini paraphrasning specific aspektlarini boshqarish bilan bajaradi. Bu yerning syntactik daraja kabi. Lekin, ular yaratilgan paraphrasning сифатини тўғри boshqarishga ruxsat bermaydi, va cheksizlik va taqdimliklik yozib qoladi. Bu yerda biz QCPG, taʼminlovchi boshqarilgan paraphras yaratish modeli, bu сифат мосламаларини тўғри boshqarishga ruxsat beradi. Koʻrsatgich, biz bir so'zni aytgan usulni tahrirlash mumkin, optik yaratilgan paraphraslarni aniqlash mumkin. Biz shunday ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bizning usuli asl ma'nosidagi paraphraslarni yaratish mumkin, va asl ma'nosini davom etish mumkin va boshqarilmagan asl asosiy sonlaridan ko'proq turli xil bo'lishi mumkin. Modellar, kodlar va maʼlumot topilmadi https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'vi': 'Thế hệ cụm từ đã được sử dụng rộng rãi trong các công việc xuôi dòng. Hầu hết các công việc đều được hưởng lợi từ những diễn văn cao chất lượng, đó là những diễn văn theo ngữ pháp tương tự, nhưng ngôn ngữ khác nhau từ câu gốc. Tạo ra các diễn văn cao cấp là một thử thách khi càng khó bảo tồn ý nghĩa khi sự đa dạng ngôn ngữ tăng dần. Những tác phẩm gần đây đạt được kết quả tốt bằng cách điều khiển các khía cạnh cụ thể của liệt thuật, như cây cú pháp. Tuy nhiên, họ không cho phép kiểm soát trực tiếp chất lượng của lời diễn giải tạo ra, và chịu đựng sự linh hoạt thấp và khả năng phóng đại. Ở đây chúng tôi đề nghị QCPG, một kiểu hình ảnh được kiểm soát theo kiểm soát chất lượng, cho phép kiểm soát các chiều chất lượng. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp đã đưa ra một câu, xác định các điểm trong không gian kiểm soát chất lượng được trông đợi sẽ cung cấp các lời giải pháp tối ưu. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi có khả năng tạo ra các diễn văn có ý nghĩa duy trì sự đa dạng cao hơn cơ sở không kiểm soát. Các mẫu, mã và dữ liệu có thể tìm thấy trong https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'nl': 'Parafrase generatie is veel gebruikt in verschillende downstream taken. De meeste taken profiteren vooral van hoogwaardige parafrases, namelijk parafrases die semantisch vergelijkbaar zijn met, maar taalkundig verschillend van, de oorspronkelijke zin. Het genereren van hoogwaardige parafrases is een uitdaging omdat het steeds moeilijker wordt om betekenis te behouden naarmate de taaldiversiteit toeneemt. Recente werken bereiken mooie resultaten door specifieke aspecten van de parafrase te beheersen, zoals de syntactische boom. Ze laten echter niet toe om de kwaliteit van de gegenereerde parafrase direct te controleren en lijden onder een lage flexibiliteit en schaalbaarheid. Hier stellen we QCPG voor, een kwaliteitsgeleide gecontroleerde parafrase generatie model, waarmee de kwaliteitsdimensies direct kunnen worden gecontroleerd. Verder stellen we een methode voor die, gegeven aan een zin, punten in de kwaliteitscontroleruimte identificeert die naar verwachting optimale gegenereerde parafrases opleveren. We laten zien dat onze methode in staat is parafrases te genereren die de oorspronkelijke betekenis behouden en tegelijkertijd een hogere diversiteit bereiken dan de ongecontroleerde baseline. De modellen, de code en de gegevens zijn te vinden in https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на парафрази е широко използвано в различни задачи надолу по веригата. Повечето задачи се възползват предимно от висококачествени парафрази, а именно тези, които са семантично сходни, но лингвистично различни от първоначалното изречение. Генерирането на висококачествени парафрази е предизвикателство, тъй като става все по-трудно да се запази смисъла с увеличаването на езиковото многообразие. Последните работи постигат добри резултати чрез контролиране на специфични аспекти на парафразата, като синтактичното дърво. Те обаче не позволяват директно да се контролира качеството на генерираната парафраза и страдат от ниска гъвкавост и мащабируемост. Тук предлагаме модел за генериране на парафрази, ръководен от качеството, който позволява директно контролиране на размерите на качеството. Освен това предлагаме метод, който в дадено изречение идентифицира точки в пространството за контрол на качеството, които се очаква да дадат оптимално генерирани парафрази. Показваме, че нашият метод е способен да генерира парафрази, които поддържат първоначалното значение, като същевременно постигат по-голямо разнообразие от неконтролираната базова линия. Моделите, кода и данните могат да бъдат намерени в https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'da': 'Parafrasgenerering er blevet udbredt i forskellige downstream opgaver. De fleste opgaver drager hovedsagelig fordel af parafraser af høj kvalitet, nemlig dem, der semantisk ligner, men sprogligt adskiller sig fra den oprindelige sætning. At generere parafraser af høj kvalitet er udfordrende, da det bliver stadig sværere at bevare mening, efterhånden som sproglig mangfoldighed stiger. Nyere værker opnår gode resultater ved at kontrollere specifikke aspekter af parafrasen, såsom dens syntaktiske træ. Men de tillader ikke direkte at kontrollere kvaliteten af den genererede parafrase og lider af lav fleksibilitet og skalerbarhed. Her foreslår vi QCPG, en kvalitetsstyret, kontrolleret parafrasegenerationsmodel, der gør det muligt at kontrollere kvalitetsdimensionerne direkte. Desuden foreslår vi en metode, der giver en sætning, identificerer punkter i kvalitetskontrolrummet, der forventes at give optimale genererede parafraser. Vi viser, at vores metode er i stand til at generere parafraser, der bevarer den oprindelige betydning og samtidig opnår større diversitet end den ukontrollerede baseline. Modellerne, koden og dataene kan findes i https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'de': 'Paraphrasen-Generierung ist in verschiedenen nachgelagerten Aufgaben weit verbreitet. Die meisten Aufgaben profitieren vor allem von hochwertigen Paraphrasen, nämlich solchen, die dem Originalsatz semantisch ähnlich sind, aber sprachlich unterschiedlich sind. Die Erzeugung hochwertiger Paraphrasen ist eine Herausforderung, da es mit zunehmender sprachlicher Vielfalt immer schwieriger wird, Bedeutung zu erhalten. Neuere Arbeiten erzielen schöne Ergebnisse, indem sie bestimmte Aspekte der Paraphrase kontrollieren, wie den syntaktischen Baum. Sie erlauben jedoch keine direkte Kontrolle über die Qualität der erzeugten Paraphrase und leiden unter geringer Flexibilität und Skalierbarkeit. Hier schlagen wir QCPG vor, ein qualitätsgeführtes gesteuertes Paraphrasen-Generierungsmodell, das eine direkte Kontrolle der Qualitätsdimensionen ermöglicht. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir eine Methode vor, die anhand eines Satzes Punkte im Qualitätskontrollraum identifiziert, von denen erwartet wird, dass sie optimal generierte Paraphrasen liefern. Wir zeigen, dass unsere Methode in der Lage ist, Paraphrasen zu generieren, die die ursprüngliche Bedeutung beibehalten und gleichzeitig eine höhere Diversität als die unkontrollierte Baseline erreichen. Die Modelle, der Code und die Daten finden Sie in https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'hr': 'Generacija parafraza je široko korišćena u različitim zadacima dolje. Većina zadataka koristi uglavnom od visoke kvalitetne parafraze, a to su oni koji su semantički slični, a ipak jezički različiti od originalne rečenice. Generiranje visokokvalitetnih parafraza je izazovno jer postaje sve teže čuvati smisao dok se povećava jezička raznolikost. Nedavni rad postigne lijepe rezultate kontroliranjem specifičnih aspekta parafraze, poput sintaktičkog drveta. Međutim, oni ne dozvoljavaju direktno kontrolirati kvalitet proizvedene parafraze i patiti od niske fleksibilnosti i skalabilnosti. Ovdje predlažemo QCPG, model koji je upravljao kvalitetom kontroliranim parafrazom, koji omogućava direktno kontrolirati dimenzije kvalitete. Nadalje, predlažemo metodu koja daje rečenicu, identificira to čke u prostoru za kontrolu kvalitete koji se očekuje da će donijeti optimalne generirane parafraze. Pokazujemo da je naš metod u mogućnosti stvoriti parafraze koji održavaju originalno značenje dok postignemo višu raznolikost nego nekontroliranu početnu liniju. Modeli, kod i podaci se nalaze u https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'id': 'Paraphrase generation has been widely used in various downstream tasks.  Most tasks benefit mainly from high quality paraphrases, namely those that are semantically similar to, yet linguistically diverse from, the original sentence.  Menciptakan parafrasa kualitas tinggi adalah tantangan karena semakin sulit untuk mempertahankan arti saat kebanyakan bahasa meningkat. Pekerjaan baru-baru ini mencapai hasil yang bagus dengan mengontrol aspek khusus parafrasa, seperti pohon sintaksnya. Namun, mereka tidak memungkinkan untuk mengontrol secara langsung kualitas parafrasa yang dihasilkan, dan menderita fleksibilitas dan skalabilitas rendah. Di sini kami mengusulkan QCPG, model parafrasa yang dikendalikan kualitas, yang memungkinkan mengendalikan langsung dimensi kualitas. Selain itu, kami menyarankan metode yang memberikan kalimat, mengidentifikasi titik di ruang kontrol kualitas yang diharapkan untuk memberikan parafrasa optimal yang dihasilkan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa metode kami mampu menghasilkan parafrasa yang mempertahankan arti asli sementara mencapai diversitas yang lebih tinggi dari dasar yang tidak dikendalikan. Model, kode, dan data dapat ditemukan di https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ko': '해석 생성은 이미 각종 하류 임무에 광범위하게 응용되었다.대다수의 임무는 주로 고품질의 해석, 즉 의미적으로는 원시 문장과 비슷하지만 언어적으로는 다른 해석에 이익을 얻는다.언어의 다양성이 증가함에 따라 보존의 의미가 점점 어려워지기 때문에 고품질의 해석을 만드는 것은 도전이다.최근의 작품은 해석의 특정한 측면, 예를 들어 문법수 등을 통제함으로써 좋은 효과를 거두었다.그러나 생성된 해석의 질을 직접 제어하는 것은 허용되지 않고 유연성과 신축성이 낮다.여기서 우리는 QCPG, 품질 유도의 제어된 의미 생성 모델을 제시했는데 이것은 품질 차원을 직접 제어할 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 한 문장을 정하고 품질 제어 공간의 점을 식별하여 가장 잘 생성된 해석을 만드는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 우리의 방법이 원시적인 의미를 보존하는 해석을 생성할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 통제되지 않는 기선보다 더 높은 다양성을 실현할 수 있음을 나타낸다.모형, 코드와 데이터는https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'tr': "Senediň döredişi görnüş görerlerde köpüräk ulanyldy. Köp görnüş işiň esasy ýokary kalitesli parafrazlerden faydalandyrýar, diýipdir semantik ýaly bolanlar, ýöne dil dilinden görnüşli sözlerden has üýtgeşik. Yüksek kalitesli parafrazleri döretmäge kynçylyk edýär sebäbi dil çeşitliginiň köprügini saýlamak kynçylyk bolýar. Ýakyndaky işleriň parafrazidiň has sahypalaryny bejermek üçin gowy netijesi başarýar, onuň sintaktik agajynyň ýaly. Ýöne olar üretilen parafrazuň kalitesini düzeden kontrol etmezlerine rugsat bermezler we düşük fleksibilitýänlikden we derejä çykarmazlykdan soňra. Bu ýerde biz QCPG'i, kwalitet guruldyrlan parafraz döredişi nusgasyna teklip edip görýäris. Bu häzirki kwalitet ölçülerini düzeden bejermek üçin mümkin edýär. Munuň üçin, bir sözlem berilen bir yöntemi maslahat berýäris, kwalitet kontrol alanynyň iň gowy döredilen paraphrasleri taýýarlamak üçin gözlenen noktalaryny tanap edýäris Biz öz yöntemimiziň başlangyç ifaýllary bejermek üçin özüniň nähili üýtgeşiklerimizi kontrol edilmedik basit çyzygyndan uzaklaşyp biljekdigini görkeýäris. Modeller, köd we maglumatlar içinde tapylýar. https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'sw': 'Kizazi cha Paraphra kimetumiwa sana katika kazi mbalimbali za mito. Kazi nyingi zinafaidia hasa kutokana na upande wa kiwango kikubwa, yaani wale ambao wanafanana na namna hiyo, lakini hata kwa lugha tofauti tofauti kutoka, hukumu ya awali. Kutengeneza vipengele vya kiwango kikubwa ni changamoto kwa kuwa inazidi kuwa vigumu kuendelea maana kwa kuwa utofauti wa lugha unaongezeka. Kazi za hivi karibuni hupata matokeo mazuri kwa kudhibiti vipengele maalum vya misemo, kama mti wake wa ushirikiano. Hata hivyo, hawaruhusu moja kwa moja kudhibiti kiwango cha upinzani kilichotengenezwa, na wanakabiliwa na udhaifu mdogo na udhaifu. Hapa tunapendekeza QCPG, modeli ya kizazi kinachoongozwa kwa ubora, ambayo inaruhusu kudhibiti kiwango cha ubora. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza njia ambayo ilitoa hukumu, inaonyesha pointi katika nafasi ya udhibiti wa kiwango ambacho inatarajiwa kutoa misingi yenye matumaini. Tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kutengeneza misingi ambayo inaendelea maana ya asili wakati wa kufikia tofauti kubwa kuliko msingi usio na udhibiti. Mifano, sheria, na taarifa zinaweza kupatikana https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'af': "Parafrase generasie is vaste gebruik in verskeie onderstreem taak. Die meeste opdragte voorwerp hoogste van hoë kwaliteit parafrase, bedoel die wat semantiese gelyk is, maar lingwisiese verskillend van, die oorspronklike seting. Gegenereer van hoë-kwaliteit parafrase is vanskeilig omdat dit vermeerder moeilik word om betekenis te bewaar as lingwisiese verskeidigheid vergroot word. Onlangse werke het goeie resultate bereik deur spesifieke aspekte van die parafrase te beheer, soos sy sintakteel boom. Maar hulle het nie toegelaat om die kwaliteit van die genereerde parafrase direk te beheer nie en van lae fleksibiliteit en skalabiliteit te lyk nie. Hier stel ons QCPG voorstel, 'n kwaliteit gedruk kontroleerde parafrase geneeringsmodel, wat toelaat direk beheer die kwaliteit dimensies. Ons bevestig nog 'n metode wat 'n seting gegee het, identifiseer punte in die kwaliteit beheer ruimte wat verwag word om optimale genereerde parafrase te gee. Ons wys dat ons metode kan genereer parafrase wat die oorspronklike betekening onderhou terwyl hoër verskeidigheid bereik is as die onkonntrolleerde basisline. Die modele, die kode en die data kan gevind word in https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'fa': 'نسل پارافریز در کار های مختلف پایین استفاده شده است. بسیاری از وظیفه\u200cها به عنوان پارافریز\u200cهای کیفیت بالا سود می\u200cدهند، یعنی کسانی که به عنوان طبیعت شبیه هستند، ولی با زبان\u200cشناسی متفاوت هستند از جمله اصلی. تولید پارافریز های کیفیت بالا سخت است، در حالی که بیشتر سخت می شود که معنی را حفظ کنید، در حالی که تنوع زبانی افزایش می دهد. کارهای اخیرا به نتایج خوب رسیده می\u200cشوند با کنترل نقطه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از عبارت، مانند درخت سنتاکتیک آن. ولی آنها اجازه نمی دهند که کیفیت پارافریز تولید شده را مستقیما کنترل کنند و از آسانی و مقیاس پایین رنج دهند. اینجا ما QCPG را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک مدل تولید پارافریز کنترل شده با کیفیت، که اجازه می\u200cدهد مستقیم کنترل اندازه\u200cهای کیفیت را کنترل کند. علاوه بر این، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به یک جمله داده شده، نقطه\u200cها را در فضای کنترل کیفیت شناسایی می\u200cکند که انتظار دارد پارافریز\u200cهای بهترین تولید شود. ما نشان می دهیم که روش ما قادر به تولید پارافراز است که معنی اصلی را حفظ می کنند در حالی که به تنوع بیشتر از خط پایین کنترل نشده است. مدل، کد و داده\u200cها می\u200cتوانند در https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i parafrazave është përdorur gjerësisht në detyra të ndryshme poshtë. Shumica e detyrave përfitojnë kryesisht nga parafrazat e cilësisë së lartë, veçanërisht ato që janë semantikisht të ngjashme me, megjithatë gjuhësisht të ndryshme nga, fraza origjinale. Gjenerimi i parafrazave të cilësisë së lartë është sfidues pasi bëhet gjithnjë e më e vështirë të ruahet kuptimi ndërsa rritet diversiteti gjuhësor. Punët e fundit arrijnë rezultate të mira duke kontrolluar aspektet specifike të parafrazës, të tilla si pema e saj sintaktike. Megjithatë, ato nuk lejojnë të kontrollojnë drejtpërdrejt cilësinë e parafrazës së gjeneruar dhe të vuajnë nga fleksibiliteti dhe shkallëzimi i ulët. Here we propose QCPG, a quality-guided controlled paraphrase generation model, that allows directly controlling the quality dimensions.  Përveç kësaj, sugjerojmë një metodë që jep një fjalim, identifikon pikat në hapësirën e kontrollit të cilësisë që pritet të japin parafraza optimale të gjeneruara. Ne tregojmë se metoda jonë është në gjendje të gjenerojë parafraza që mbajnë kuptimin origjinal duke arritur diversitet më të lartë se baza e pakontrolluar. Modelet, kodet dhe të dhënat mund të gjenden në https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'am': 'የፓራፓራሲ ትውልድ በአውራው ወንዝ ውስጥ በተለየ ሥራ ተጠቃሚ ሆኖአል፡፡ አብዛኞቹ ስራዎች አብዛኛውን ከፍተኛ ጥሩ መግለጫ የሚጠቅሙት፣ በቋንቋው ግን በመጀመሪያው ግንኙነት የተለየ ናቸው፡፡ የቋንቋዊ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት እንደሚጨመር አእምሮውን በመጠበቅ የራቀ ጥሩ ግንኙነትን መግለጫ ነው፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ የሚሠራ መልካም ፍሬዎችን ከመቆጣጠር የተለየ የፋራphrase ክፍሎች፣ እንደዚህ የsyntactic ዛፍ አግኝቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን የተፈጠረውን የፊደል ግንኙነትን ቀጥተኛ ለመቆጣጠር አይፈቅዱም፣ እናም ከንጹሕ ብልሃት እና ከስህተት መከራ አይቀበሉም፡፡ Here we propose QCPG, a quality-guided controlled paraphrase generation model, that allows directly controlling the quality dimensions.  በተጨማሪም፣ የግንኙነት ሰጥቷል፣ የሥርዓት መቆጣጠር ማሰናከል በተስፋት ውስጥ መቆጣጠርን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የሥርዓታችን ልዩ ልዩነት ከመስመር መሠረት ይልቅ የበለጠ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ ምሳሌዎቹ፣ ኮድ እና ዳታዎች ይገኙበታል https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'az': "Parafraz nəsili müxtəlif aşağı-aşağı işlərdə çox istifadə edildi. Həqiqətən, çox işlər yüksək kaliteli parafrazlərdən faydalanır, məsələn, semantik kimi bənzəyənlər, lakin dil dilindən təşkil edilənlər, orijinal sözlərdən. Yüksek kaliteli parafrazləri yaratmaq çətindir, çünki dil müxtəlifliyi artırmaq üçün anlamını qorumaq daha çətindir. Son işlər parafrazin bəzisini, sintaktik ağacının bəzisini kontrol edərək gözəl nəticələri başa düşər. Lakin onlar yaratdığı parafrazin keyfiyyətini do ğrudan kontrol etməyə izin verməzlər və düşük fleksibiliyyətdən və çəkiliyyətdən çəkinməzlər. Burada QCPG'i təklif edirik, kaliteli tədricləndirilmiş parafraz üretilməsi modeli, kaliteli ölçülərini doğrudan kontrol edə bilər. Daha sonra, bir cümlədə verilən bir metod təbliğ edirik, qabiliyyəti kontrol alanında nöqtələr tanıyır ki, gözlənilən optimal ürəkləndirilmiş parafrazlər yetirəcəkdir. Biz göstəririk ki, metodumuzun başlangıç anlamını sürdürən parafrazləri yaratmaq mümkün olduğunu göstərir ki, müxtəlif baxımından daha yüksək müxtəlif rəngli olaraq. Modellər, kodlar və verilər https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রাজ প্রজন্ম বিভিন্ন নিচের প্রজন্মে ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। Most tasks benefit mainly from high quality paraphrases, namely those that are semantically similar to, yet linguistically diverse from, the original sentence.  উচ্চমানের প্যারাফ্রেস তৈরি করা চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে কারণ ভাষাগত বৈচিত্র্য বৃদ্ধি করার মানে বাড়তে ব্যর্থ হচ্ছে। সাম্প্রতিক কাজে প্যারাফ্রেসের নির্দিষ্ট বিষয় নিয়ন্ত্রণের মাধ্যমে সুন্দর ফলাফল পেয়েছে, যেমন তার সিন্ট্যাকটিক তবে তারা সৃষ্ট প্যারাফ্রেসের মান সরাসরি নিয়ন্ত্রণ করতে পারে না এবং তারা নিম্নলিখিত এবং অপব্যবস্থা থেকে কষ্ট দেয়। এখানে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি কিসিপিজি, একটি মান নিয়ন্ত্রণ-পরিচালিত প্যারাফ্রেস প্রজন্ম মডেল, যা মানের মান নিয়ন্ত্রণের সুযোগ এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি উপায়ের পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি যা একটি বাক্য দিয়েছে, মান নিয়ন্ত্রণ স্থানে বিন্দুক পরিচিত করা হয়েছে, যা আশা করা হচ্ছে যে অপটিমা আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্যারাফ্রেক্স তৈরি করতে পারে যা মূল অর্থ রক্ষা করতে পারে এবং অনিয়ন্ত্রিত বৈচিত্র্যের চেয়ে  মডেল, কোড এবং তথ্য পাওয়া যাবে https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'bs': 'Generacija parafraza je široko korišćena u različitim zadacima dolje. Većina zadataka koristi uglavnom od visoke kvalitetne parafraze, a to su oni koji su semantički slični, a ipak jezički različiti od originalne rečenice. Generiranje visokokvalitetnih parafraza je izazovno jer postaje sve teže čuvati smisao dok se povećava jezička raznolikost. Nedavni rad postigne dobre rezultate kontroliranjem specifičnih aspekta parafraze, poput sintaktičkog drveta. Međutim, oni ne dozvoljavaju direktno kontrolirati kvalitet proizvedene parafraze i patiti od niske fleksibilnosti i skalabilnosti. Ovdje predlažemo QCPG, model koji je upravljao kvalitetom kontroliranim parafrazom, koji omogućava direktno kontrolirati dimenzije kvalitete. Nadalje, predlažemo metodu koja daje rečenicu, identificira to čke u prostoru za kontrolu kvalitete koji se očekuje da će donijeti optimalne generirane parafraze. Pokazujemo da je naša metoda sposobna da stvori parafraze koje održavaju originalno značenje dok postignemo veću raznolikost od nekontroliranog početnog linije. Modeli, kod i podaci se nalaze u https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'hy': 'Փարաֆրեսի ստեղծման մեծ մասը օգտագործվել է տարբեր հետագա խնդիրներում: Մեծ մասը հատկապես շահում է բարձր որակի պարաֆրեզներից, հատկապես նրանցից, որոնք սեմանտիկապես նման են սկզբնական նախադասություններից, սակայն լեզվաբանական տարբեր են: բարձր որակի պարաֆրեզներ ստեղծելը դժվար է, քանի որ ավելի ու ավելի դժվար է պահպանել իմաստը, մինչ լեզվաբանական բազմազանությունը աճում է: Վերջին աշխատանքները լավ արդյունքներ են ստանում վերահսկելով պարաֆրեսի հատուկ ասպեկտները, ինչպիսիք են նրա սինտակտիկ ծառը: Այնուամենայնիվ, դրանք թույլ չեն տալիս ուղղակիորեն վերահսկել ստեղծված պարաֆրեսի որակը, և տառապում են ցածր ճկունությունից և ընդլայնելիությունից: Այստեղ մենք առաջարկում ենք QCPG-ը, որակի ուղղությամբ կառավարվող պարաֆրեսի ստեղծման մոդել, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս անմիջապես կառավարել որակի չափերը: Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մեթոդ, որը նախադասություն է տալիս, բացահայտում է որակի վերահսկողության տարածքում գտնվող կետերը, որոնք ակնկալում են հանգեցնելու օպտիմալ ստեղծված պարաֆրեզներ: We show that our method is able to generate paraphrases which maintain the original meaning while achieving higher diversity than the uncontrolled baseline.  Մոդելները, կոդը և տվյալները կարող են գտնվել https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ca': "La generació de parafrases s'ha utilitzat ampliament en diverses tasques avall. La majoria de les tasques beneficien principalment de parafrases d'alta qualitat, és a dir, aquelles que són semànticament similars a, però lingüísticament diferents de, la frase original. Generar paràfrases d'alta qualitat és difícil, ja que cada cop més difícil conservar el sentit mentre creix la diversitat lingüística. Les obres recents aconsegueixen bons resultats controlant aspectes específics de la parafrase, com el seu arbre sinàctic. No obstant això, no permeten controlar directament la qualitat de la parafrase generada, i pateixen baixa flexibilitat i escalabilitat. Aquí proposem QCPG, un model de generació de parafrases controlada de qualitat, que permet controlar directament les dimensions de qualitat. A més, suggerem un mètode que, dada una frase, identifique punts en l'espai de control de qualitat que s'espera que generin paràfrases optimes. Mostrem que el nostre mètode és capaç de generar parafrases que mantenen el significat original mentre aconsegueixen una diversitat més alta que la basa descontrollada. Els models, el codi i les dades es poden trobar https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'cs': 'Generování parafráz bylo široce používáno v různých následných úkolech. Většina úkolů těží především z vysoce kvalitních parafrází, konkrétně těch, které jsou sémanticky podobné, ale jazykově odlišné od původní věty. Generování vysoce kvalitních parafrází je náročné, protože s rostoucí jazykovou rozmanitostí je stále obtížnější zachovat význam. Nedávné práce dosahují pěkných výsledků kontrolou specifických aspektů parafráze, jako je například syntaktický strom. Neumožňují však přímo kontrolovat kvalitu generované parafráze a trpí nízkou flexibilitou a škálovatelností. Zde navrhujeme QCPG, model řízeného generování parafráz řízených kvalitou, který umožňuje přímo ovládat rozměry kvality. Dále navrhujeme metodu, která v dané větě identifikuje body v prostoru kontroly kvality, u nichž se očekává optimální generované parafráze. Ukazujeme, že naše metoda je schopna generovat parafráze, které zachovávají původní význam a zároveň dosahují vyšší diverzity než nekontrolovaná základní linie. Modely, kód a data lze nalézt v https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'et': 'Parafraaside genereerimist on laialdaselt kasutatud erinevates järgnevates ülesannetes. Enamik ülesandeid saavad kasu peamiselt kvaliteetsetest parafraasidest, nimelt need, mis on semantiliselt sarnased alglausega, kuid keeleliselt erinevad sellest. Kvaliteetsete parafraaside genereerimine on keeruline, sest keelelise mitmekesisuse suurenedes muutub tähenduse säilitamine üha raskemaks. Hiljutised tööd saavutavad häid tulemusi kontrollides parafraasi konkreetseid aspekte, näiteks selle süntaktilist puud. Kuid need ei võimalda otseselt kontrollida genereeritud parafraasi kvaliteeti ning kannatavad madala paindlikkuse ja skaleeritavuse all. Siin pakume välja QCPG, kvaliteedipõhise kontrollitud parafraasi genereerimise mudeli, mis võimaldab otseselt kontrollida kvaliteedimõõtmeid. Lisaks soovitame meetodit, mis annab lause, identifitseerib kvaliteedikontrolli ruumi punkte, mis eeldatavasti annavad optimaalselt genereeritud parafraase. Me näitame, et meie meetod on võimeline genereerima parafraase, mis säilitab algse tähenduse, saavutades samas suurema mitmekesisuse kui kontrollimatu lähtejoon. Mudelid, kood ja andmed leiate aadressilt https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'fi': 'Parafraasien tuottamista on käytetty laajalti erilaisissa jatkojalostustehtävissä. Useimmat tehtävät hyötyvät pääasiassa korkealaatuisista parafraaseista, eli niistä, jotka ovat semanttisesti samankaltaisia, mutta kielellisesti erilaisia alkuperäisestä lauseesta. Laadukkaiden parafraasien luominen on haastavaa, sillä merkityksen säilyttäminen kielellisen monimuotoisuuden lisääntyessä vaikeutuu. Viimeaikaiset teokset saavuttavat hyviä tuloksia kontrolloimalla parafraasin tiettyjä näkökohtia, kuten sen syntaktista puuta. Ne eivät kuitenkaan salli suoraan hallita luotujen parafraasien laatua, ja ne kärsivät alhaisesta joustavuudesta ja skaalautuvuudesta. Tässä ehdotamme QCPG:tä, laatuohjattua kontrolloitua parafraasien generointimallia, jonka avulla laatumitat voidaan ohjata suoraan. Lisäksi ehdotamme menetelmää, joka lauseen perusteella tunnistaa laadunvalvontatilan kohdat, joiden odotetaan tuottavan optimaalisesti tuotettuja parafraaseja. Osoitamme, että menetelmämme pystyy tuottamaan parafraaseja, jotka säilyttävät alkuperäisen merkityksen ja saavuttavat suuremman monimuotoisuuden kuin kontrolloimaton lähtötilanne. Mallit, koodi ja data löytyvät osoitteesta https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'ha': "Paraphrase generation has been widely used in various downstream tasks.  Maɓallin aikin su na amfani kawai daga fassarar nau'i mai girma, kamar waɗanda ke daidai da musamman, kuma amma cikin harshen, masu buƙata daga maganar farko. Tsarinta parameteri na sifa-nau'i yana tsãge, kwani ita yana ƙara yin tsanani ga tsari da ma'anin idan ana ƙara daraja-linguistic. A yanzu aikin da suke iya samun matsala mai kyau game da ku yi Control masu ƙayyade na fassarar, kamar itãciyar syntactic. Haƙĩƙa, bã su yarda su iya tsayar da sifar maganar da aka ƙãga, kuma suna sami da kuma bã ya kasancẽwa. @ info: whatsthis Da haka, Munã shawarar da wata hanyor da ya bãyar da wata kalma, yana gane pointi cikin filin tsari da za'a ƙayyade ka ƙara parameteri da aka ƙãga halittar. Tuna nũna cewa metodenmu za'a iya iya ƙiƙiro fassarar da ke tsare ma'anar farko da za'a sami da bambanci mafi girma daga layin da ba'a lissafa ba. @ info https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé sing paling nggo wigatining pararésa nggawe pararésa, kuwi ngono sapa-wigatiné kaya ngono terus-wigatiné, kuwi wis dipulangan luwih apik, sapa-wigatiné sing paling-itik saiki. Jejaring echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness label politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé ngerasakno punika dipalamat kang nggawe pararétarung sing paling nggawe barang-barang sing paling nggawe barang tanggal kuwi tindakan ketahan model, kode lan data iso dianggap https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'he': 'דור פראפרזיה השתמש באופן רחב במשימות אחורות. Most tasks benefit mainly from high quality paraphrases, namely those that are semantically similar to, yet linguistically diverse from, the original sentence.  לייצר פראפרסמות איכותיות גבוהה זה מאתגר כיוון שהופך קשה יותר ויותר לשמור על המשמעות כשמגוון שפתי מגדל. עבודות אחרונות מגיעות לתוצאות נחמדות על ידי שליטה בנקודות ספציפיים של המילה, כמו עץ הסינטקטי שלה. בכל אופן, הם לא מאפשרים לשלוט ישירות באיכות המילה המיוצרת, ולסבול מגמישות נמוכה ומקבילות. כאן אנו מציעים QCPG, מודל דוגמא של דוגמא של דוגמא מונח באיכות, שמאפשר לשלוט ישירות במימדים האיכות. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מציעים שיטה שנתנה משפט, מזהה נקודות בחלל שליטת איכות שמצפויים להביא פראפרסמות יוצרות אופטימיות. אנחנו מראים שהשיטה שלנו מסוגלת ליצור פראפרסמות שמשמרות את המשמעות המקורית בזמן להשיג מגוון גבוה יותר מאשר הבסיס הלא שולט. הדוגמנים, הקוד והנתונים יכולים למצוא https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje parafraz se pogosto uporablja pri različnih nadaljnjih nalogah. Večina nalog ima predvsem koristi od kakovostnih parafraz, in sicer tistih, ki so semantično podobne izvirnemu stavku, vendar jezikovno različne od njega. Ustvarjanje visokokakovostnih parafraz je izziv, saj je z naraščanjem jezikovne raznolikosti vedno težko ohraniti pomen. Nedavna dela dosegajo lepe rezultate z nadzorom specifičnih vidikov parafraze, kot je njeno sintaktično drevo. Vendar pa ne omogočajo neposrednega nadzora kakovosti ustvarjene parafraze in trpijo zaradi nizke fleksibilnosti in razširljivosti. Predlagamo QCPG, kakovostno voden model generiranja parafraz, ki omogoča neposredno nadzorovanje dimenzij kakovosti. Poleg tega predlagamo metodo, ki v stavku določi točke v kontrolnem prostoru kakovosti, za katere se pričakuje, da bodo ustvarile optimalno ustvarjene parafraze. Pokazujemo, da je naša metoda sposobna ustvariti parafraze, ki ohranjajo prvotni pomen in hkrati dosegajo večjo raznolikost od nenadzorovane osnovne vrednosti. Modeli, koda in podatki so na voljo v https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.', 'bo': 'Paraphrase generation has been widely used in various downstream tasks. བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་མང་ཆོས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྡན་ཞིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོད་ཐུབ་པ་དེ་མང་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡོད། དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལྡན་དང་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་བཟོ་བཞིན་པའི་ཚིག དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་བཟོ་ཚོང་ཁང་གི་གནད་འགའ་འགོད་པ་གནད་དོན་དག་ཚད་ལུགས་སྐྱོན་པ་ཞིག་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྨན་ཅིག་གི་རང་བཞིན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གདོང་ཚད་ཐང་མི་མཐུན་པས། འདིར་འོང་གིས་ QCPG ལ་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ནུས་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལུགས འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་འབྲས་བྱིན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་པ་དེ་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་སྒྲིག་ཚད་བར་སྟོང་ནང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བཟོ་བཏང་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ངོ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཡོད་ མིག་ཆས། སྔོན་དབྱིབས། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དང་། ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དེ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/IBM/quality-controlled-paraphrase-generation.'}
{'en': 'Enhanced Multi-Channel Graph Convolutional Network for Aspect Sentiment Triplet Extraction', 'ar': 'إنشاء أمثلة على القاموس الذي يمكن التحكم فيه: إنشاء أمثلة الجمل لجماهير مستهدفة محددة', 'pt': 'Geração de exemplo de dicionário controlável: geração de frases de exemplo para públicos-alvo específicos', 'fr': "Génération d'exemples de dictionnaires contrôlables\xa0: génération de phrases d'exemple pour des publics cibles spécifiques", 'es': 'Generación de ejemplos de diccionarios controlables: generación de oraciones de ejemplo para audiencias específicas', 'ja': 'コントロール可能な辞書のサンプル生成:特定のターゲットオーディエンスのためのサンプル文の生成', 'zh': '可控字典示例生:为特定受众生成示例句', 'hi': 'नियंत्रणीय शब्दकोश उदाहरण जनरेशन: विशिष्ट लक्षित ऑडियंस के लिए उदाहरण वाक्य जनरेट करना', 'ru': 'Генерация примеров управляемого словаря: генерация предложений-примеров для конкретной целевой аудитории', 'ga': 'Foclóir Inrialaithe Giniúint Samplach: Pianbhreitheanna Samplacha a Ghiniúint do Lucht Féachana Sprioctha Sonracha', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Ellenőrizhető szótár Példageneráció: Példamondatok generálása konkrét célzott közönségekhez', 'el': 'Ελεγχόμενη γενιά παραδειγμάτων λεξικού: Δημιουργία παραδειγματικών προτάσεων για συγκεκριμένα στοχευμένα ακροατήρια', 'kk': 'Басқару мүмкін сөздік мысалы құру: Ерекше мақсатты аудиториялардың мысалы сөздерін құру', 'it': 'Generazione di esempi di dizionario controllabile: Generazione di frasi di esempio per un pubblico mirato specifico', 'mk': 'Генерација на пример за контролиран речник: генерирање примерни реченици за специфични насочени публики', 'lt': 'Kontroliuojamo žodyno pavyzdžių generacija: konkrečiai tikslinei auditorijai skirtų pavyzdžių rengimas', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Contoh Kamus yang boleh Dikawal: Menjana Maklumat Contoh untuk Audiensi Sasaran Khusus', 'ml': 'നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്ന നിഘണ്ടിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണമായ ഉദാഹരണമാണു്: പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള ആധിപതികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Eżempji Kontrollabbli ta’ Dikjarazzjoni: Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Sentenzi Eżempji għal Awdituri Speċifiċi mmirati', 'mn': 'Controlable Dictionary Example Generation: Creating Example Sentences for Specific Target Audiences', 'pl': 'Generowanie przykładów słownika sterowanego: generowanie zdań przykładowych dla określonych grup docelowych', 'no': 'Eksempel på oppretting av kontrollbare ordbok: Lagar eksempel frå eksempel for spesifikke målte publikum', 'ro': 'Generarea exemplelor de dicționar controlabilă: Generarea unor sentințe de exemplu pentru anumite publice vizate', 'sr': 'Generacija primjera rečnika: Generacija primjernih rečenica za posebnu ciljnu publiku', 'si': 'පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විධානය විදිහට උදාහරණය: විශේෂ ලක්ෂණිත ප්\u200dරධානකය සඳහා උදාහරණ වචන වච', 'so': 'Tusaale ahaan luqada la maamulo: Generating tusaale Doorsooyinka', 'sv': 'Kontrollerbar ordlista Exempelgenerering: Generera exempelmeningar för specifika målgrupper', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட அகராதி உதாரணம் உருவாக்கு: குறிப்பிட்ட சேர்க்கப்பட்ட மாற்றிகளுக்கான உதாரணமான வாக்குறி', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chế độ điển hình điều khiển: Tạo ra các câu án điển hình cho thính giả đích cao đặc biệt', 'bg': 'Генериране на примери за контролируем речник: генериране на примерни изречения за конкретни целеви аудитории', 'nl': 'Beheerbare woordenboek Voorbeeldgeneratie: Voorbeeldzinnen genereren voor specifieke doelgroepen', 'hr': 'Generacija primjera riječnika za kontrolu: Generacija primjernih izraza za specifičnu ciljnu publiku', 'da': 'Kontrollerbar ordbog Eksempelgenerering: Generering af eksempelssætninger for bestemte målrettede målgrupper', 'id': 'Generasi Contoh Kamus Kontrollable: Menjana Perkataan Contoh untuk Audiensi Tersasar Spesifik', 'de': 'Steuerbare WÃ¶rterbuchbeispielgenerierung: Generieren von BeispielsÃ¤tzen fÃ¼r bestimmte Zielgruppen', 'ko': '제어 가능한 사전 예제 생성: 특정 대상 사용자에게 예제 문장 생성', 'fa': 'تولید مثال عبارت کلمات کنترل قابل تولید: تولید کردن کلمات مثال برای تماشاگران هدف خاصی', 'sw': 'Mfano wa Tamko la Lugha: Kutengeneza Mifano kwa ajili ya Audience Wasiolengwa', 'af': 'Kontroleer Woordeboek Voorbeeld Genereer: Genereer voorbeeld Uitdrukkings vir Spesifieke Teëlte Uitdrukkings', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i shembujve të kontrollueshëm të fjalorit: Gjenerimi i shembujve të dënimeve për audiencat specifike të synuara', 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Կահսկելի բառարանի օրինակ ստեղծելը. հատուկ նպատակային հանդիսատեսների օրինակ արտահայտություններ ստեղծելը', 'az': 'Kontrol olaraq S칬zl칲k Misal Yap캼land캼rma: 칐zg칲r Hedef S칬zl칲kl톛ri 칲칞칲n Misal S칬zl칲kl톛ri Olur', 'bn': 'নিয়ন্ত্রণিত অভিধানের উদাহরণ: নির্দিষ্ট ট টার্গেট করা অ্যাডিয়েন্সের জন্য উদাহরণ সেন্টার তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Generacija primjera proizvodnje rečnika: Generacija primjernih rečenica za specifičnu ciljnu publiku', 'ca': "Generació d'exemple de diccionari controlable: generació d'exemples de frases per audiències específices mirades", 'cs': 'Generování příkladů řízeného slovníku: Generování příkladových vět pro specifické cílené publikum', 'et': 'Kontrollitava sõnaraamatu näidete genereerimine: näidislausete genereerimine konkreetsetele sihtrühmadele', 'fi': 'Ohjattava sanakirja Esimerkkien luominen: Esimerkkilauseiden luominen tietyille kohderyhmille', 'tr': 'Control', 'jv': 'General', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje primerov kontroliranega slovarja: Ustvarjanje primerov stavkov za določene ciljne skupine', 'he': 'דוגמא מילון שולטת: יוצרת גזרות דוגמאות לקהלים מסויימים', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Controllable Dictionary Example Generation: Generating Example Sentences for Specific Targeted Audiences'}
{'en': 'Aspect Sentiment Triplet Extraction (ASTE) is an emerging sentiment analysis task. Most of the existing studies focus on devising a new tagging scheme that enables the model to extract the sentiment triplets in an end-to-end fashion. However, these methods ignore the relations between words for ASTE task. In this paper, we propose an Enhanced Multi-Channel Graph Convolutional Network model (EMC-GCN) to fully utilize the relations between words. Specifically, we first define ten types of relations for ASTE task, and then adopt a biaffine attention module to embed these relations as an adjacent tensor between words in a sentence. After that, our EMC-GCN transforms the sentence into a multi-channel graph by treating words and the relation adjacent tensor as nodes and edges, respectively. Thus, relation-aware node representations can be learnt. Furthermore, we consider diverse linguistic features to enhance our EMC-GCN model. Finally, we design an effective refining strategy on EMC-GCN for word-pair representation refinement, which considers the implicit results of aspect and opinion extraction when determining whether word pairs match or not. Extensive experimental results on the benchmark datasets demonstrate that the effectiveness and robustness of our proposed model, which outperforms state-of-the-art methods significantly.', 'es': 'Las oraciones de ejemplo para palabras específicas en un diccionario desempeñan un papel importante para ayudar a los lectores a entender el uso de las palabras. Tradicionalmente, las oraciones de ejemplo en un diccionario suelen ser creadas por expertos en lingüística, que requieren mucha mano de obra y conocimientos. En este artículo, presentamos el problema de la generación de oraciones de ejemplo de diccionario, con el objetivo de generar automáticamente oraciones de ejemplo de diccionario para palabras específicas de acuerdo con las definiciones correspondientes. Esta tarea es un desafío, especialmente para las palabras polisémicas, porque las oraciones generadas deben reflejar los diferentes usos y significados de estas palabras específicas. Los lectores objetivo también pueden tener diferentes antecedentes y niveles educativos. Es esencial generar oraciones de ejemplo que puedan ser comprensibles para diferentes orígenes y niveles de audiencia. Para resolver estos problemas, proponemos un modelo controlable y consciente de palabras objetivo para esta tarea. Nuestro modelo propuesto puede generar ejemplos razonables para palabras específicas, incluso para palabras polisémicas. Además, nuestro modelo permite a los usuarios proporcionar un control explícito sobre los atributos relacionados con la legibilidad, como la longitud y la complejidad léxica, generando así ejemplos adecuados para el público objetivo. Las evaluaciones automáticas y humanas en el conjunto de datos del diccionario Oxford muestran que nuestro modelo puede generar ejemplos adecuados para palabras específicas con definiciones específicas y, al mismo tiempo, cumplir con la legibilidad deseada.', 'fr': "Les exemples de phrases pour des mots ciblés dans un dictionnaire jouent un rôle important pour aider les lecteurs à comprendre l'usage des mots. Traditionnellement, les exemples de phrases dans un dictionnaire sont généralement créés par des experts en linguistique, qui demandent beaucoup de travail et de connaissances. Dans cet article, nous présentons le problème de la génération de phrases d'exemple de dictionnaire, dans le but de générer automatiquement des exemples de phrases de dictionnaire pour des mots ciblés en fonction des définitions correspondantes. Cette tâche est particulièrement difficile pour les mots polysémiques, car les phrases générées doivent refléter différents usages et significations de ces mots ciblés. Les lecteurs ciblés peuvent également avoir des antécédents et des niveaux d'éducation différents. Il est essentiel de générer des exemples de phrases compréhensibles pour différents milieux et niveaux de public. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons un modèle contrôlable prenant en compte les mots cibles pour cette tâche. Le modèle que nous proposons peut générer des exemples raisonnables pour des mots ciblés, même pour des mots polysémiques. De plus, notre modèle permet aux utilisateurs de fournir un contrôle explicite sur les attributs liés à la lisibilité, tels que la longueur et la complexité lexicale, générant ainsi des exemples appropriés pour des publics cibles. Les évaluations automatiques et humaines sur le jeu de données du dictionnaire Oxford montrent que notre modèle peut générer des exemples appropriés pour des mots ciblés avec des définitions spécifiques tout en respectant la lisibilité souhaitée.", 'pt': 'Frases de exemplo para palavras específicas em um dicionário desempenham um papel importante para ajudar os leitores a entender o uso das palavras. Tradicionalmente, frases de exemplo em um dicionário geralmente são criadas por especialistas em linguística, que exigem muito trabalho e conhecimento. Neste artigo, apresentamos o problema de geração de frases de exemplo de dicionário, com o objetivo de gerar automaticamente frases de exemplo de dicionário para palavras-alvo de acordo com as definições correspondentes. Essa tarefa é desafiadora especialmente para palavras polissêmicas, pois as frases geradas precisam refletir diferentes usos e significados dessas palavras-alvo. Os leitores direcionados também podem ter diferentes origens e níveis educacionais. É essencial gerar frases de exemplo que possam ser compreensíveis para diferentes origens e níveis de audiência. Para resolver esses problemas, propomos um modelo controlável de reconhecimento de palavras-alvo para essa tarefa. Nosso modelo proposto pode gerar exemplos razoáveis para palavras direcionadas, mesmo para palavras polissêmicas. Além disso, nosso modelo permite que os usuários forneçam controle explícito sobre os atributos relacionados à legibilidade, como comprimento e complexidade lexical, gerando exemplos adequados para o público-alvo. Avaliações automáticas e humanas no conjunto de dados do dicionário Oxford mostram que nosso modelo pode gerar exemplos adequados para palavras-alvo com definições específicas, atendendo à legibilidade desejada.', 'ar': 'تلعب الجمل النموذجية للكلمات المستهدفة في القاموس دورًا مهمًا لمساعدة القراء على فهم استخدام الكلمات. تقليديا ، عادة ما يتم إنشاء الجمل النموذجية في القاموس من قبل خبراء اللغويات ، والتي تتطلب عمالة مكثفة وكثيفة المعرفة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مشكلة إنشاء جملة أمثلة من القاموس ، بهدف إنشاء جمل أمثلة من القاموس تلقائيًا للكلمات المستهدفة وفقًا للتعريفات المقابلة. تمثل هذه المهمة تحديًا خاصًا للكلمات متعددة المعاني ، لأن الجمل المولدة تحتاج إلى أن تعكس الاستخدامات والمعاني المختلفة لهذه الكلمات المستهدفة. قد يكون للقراء المستهدفين أيضًا خلفيات ومستويات تعليمية مختلفة. من الضروري إنشاء جمل أمثلة يمكن فهمها من خلفيات ومستويات مختلفة من الجمهور. لحل هذه المشكلات ، نقترح نموذجًا مدركًا للكلمات المستهدفة يمكن التحكم فيه لهذه المهمة. يمكن أن يولد نموذجنا المقترح أمثلة معقولة للكلمات المستهدفة ، حتى للكلمات متعددة المعاني. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يتيح نموذجنا للمستخدمين توفير تحكم صريح في السمات المتعلقة بقابلية القراءة ، مثل الطول والتعقيد المعجمي ، وبالتالي إنشاء أمثلة مناسبة للجماهير المستهدفة. تُظهر التقييمات التلقائية والبشرية في مجموعة بيانات قاموس أكسفورد أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يولد أمثلة مناسبة للكلمات المستهدفة ذات التعريفات المحددة مع تلبية إمكانية القراءة المطلوبة.', 'hi': 'शब्दकोश में लक्षित शब्दों के लिए उदाहरण वाक्य पाठकों को शब्दों के उपयोग को समझने में मदद करने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं। परंपरागत रूप से, एक शब्दकोश में उदाहरण वाक्य आमतौर पर भाषाविज्ञान विशेषज्ञों द्वारा बनाए जाते हैं, जो श्रम-गहन और ज्ञान-गहन होते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम शब्दकोश उदाहरण वाक्य पीढ़ी की समस्या का परिचय देते हैं, जिसका उद्देश्य संबंधित परिभाषाओं के अनुसार लक्षित शब्दों के लिए शब्दकोश उदाहरण वाक्यों को स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न करना है। यह कार्य विशेष रूप से पॉलीसेमस शब्दों के लिए चुनौतीपूर्ण है, क्योंकि उत्पन्न वाक्यों को इन लक्षित शब्दों के विभिन्न उपयोगों और अर्थों को प्रतिबिंबित करने की आवश्यकता होती है। लक्षित पाठकों के पास अलग-अलग पृष्ठभूमि और शैक्षिक स्तर भी हो सकते हैं। उदाहरण वाक्यों को उत्पन्न करना आवश्यक है जो विभिन्न पृष्ठभूमि और दर्शकों के स्तर के लिए समझ में आ सकते हैं। इन समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए, हम इस कार्य के लिए एक नियंत्रणीय लक्ष्य-शब्द-जागरूक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल लक्षित शब्दों के लिए उचित उदाहरण उत्पन्न कर सकता है, यहां तक कि पॉलीसेमस शब्दों के लिए भी। इसके अलावा, हमारा मॉडल उपयोगकर्ताओं को पठनीयता से संबंधित विशेषताओं पर स्पष्ट नियंत्रण प्रदान करने की अनुमति देता है, जैसे कि लंबाई और लेक्सिकल जटिलता, इस प्रकार लक्षित दर्शकों के लिए उपयुक्त उदाहरण उत्पन्न करते हैं। ऑक्सफोर्ड शब्दकोश डेटासेट पर स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल वांछित पठनीयता को पूरा करते हुए विशिष्ट परिभाषाओं के साथ लक्षित शब्दों के लिए उपयुक्त उदाहरण उत्पन्न कर सकता है।', 'zh': '字典之单词者示例句在助读者解单词之用法起着重。 古者,字典之例句,常创于语言学,劳动密集型知密集型也。 本文引字典示例句生,指随义自生单词字典示例句。 其于多义词尤有挑战性,盖成句须见其异用法义也。 读者或有异背景而教之。 须成宜不同背景与受众水平示例句。 为此一可控,感于模形。 吾举模可为的单词生成理示例,虽多义单词。 此外,吾法许用户与可读性相关者(如长短词法复杂性)显式制之,以受众生之示例。 牛津词典数集自与人工评,吾形可为特定义者单词生成其示例,兼足其可读性。', 'ja': '辞書のターゲットとなる単語の例文は、読者が単語の使用法を理解するのに重要な役割を果たします。 従来、辞書の例文は、通常、労働集約的で知識集約的な言語学の専門家によって作成されます。 本稿では、辞書例文生成の問題点を紹介し、対応する定義に従って対象単語の辞書例文を自動生成することを目指す。 このタスクは、特に多義的な単語にとっては困難である。生成された文は、これらのターゲットとなる単語の異なる用法と意味を反映する必要があるからである。 ターゲットを絞った読者は、異なる背景と教育レベルを持つ場合もある。 さまざまな背景やオーディエンスのレベルで理解できる例文を生成することが不可欠です。 これらの問題を解決するために、私たちはこのタスクのために制御可能なターゲットワード認識モデルを提案します。 私たちの提案するモデルは、多義的な単語であっても、ターゲットを絞った単語の合理的な例を生成することができます。 さらに、当社のモデルは、ユーザーが長さや語彙の複雑さなど、可読性に関連する属性を明示的に制御することを可能にし、ターゲットオーディエンスに適した例を生成します。 オックスフォード辞書データセットの自動評価とヒューマン評価は、当社のモデルが望ましい可読性を満たしながら、特定の定義を持つターゲット単語の適切な例を生成できることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Примеры предложений для целевых слов в словаре играют важную роль, помогая читателям понять употребление слов. Традиционно примеры предложений в словаре обычно создаются специалистами-лингвистами, которые являются трудоемкими и наукоемкими. В данной работе мы представляем проблему генерации предложений примера словаря, направленную на автоматическую генерацию предложений примера словаря для целевых слов согласно соответствующим определениям. Эта задача является сложной, особенно для многозначных слов, потому что сгенерированные предложения должны отражать различные употребления и значения этих целевых слов. Целевые читатели также могут иметь различный опыт и образовательный уровень. Важно генерировать примерные предложения, которые могут быть понятны для разных слоев и уровней аудитории. Для решения этих задач мы предлагаем для этой задачи управляемую модель «цель-слово-сознание». Наша предлагаемая модель может генерировать разумные примеры для целевых слов, даже для многозначных слов. Кроме того, наша модель позволяет пользователям обеспечивать четкий контроль атрибутов, связанных с читаемостью, таких как длина и лексическая сложность, тем самым генерируя подходящие примеры для целевой аудитории. Автоматические и человеческие оценки на наборе данных Оксфордского словаря показывают, что наша модель может генерировать подходящие примеры для целевых слов с конкретными определениями, одновременно удовлетворяя желаемой читабельности.', 'ga': 'Tá ról tábhachtach ag abairtí samplacha do spriocfhocail i bhfoclóir chun cuidiú le léitheoirí úsáid na bhfocal a thuiscint. Go traidisiúnta, cruthaíonn saineolaithe teangeolaíochta abairtí samplacha i bhfoclóir, atá dian ar shaothar agus dianeolais. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach an fhadhb a bhaineann le giniúint abairtí samplaí foclóir, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige abairtí samplacha foclóir a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch le haghaidh spriocfhocail de réir na sainmhínithe comhfhreagracha. Tá an tasc seo dúshlánach go háirithe maidir le focail ilghnéitheacha, toisc go gcaithfidh na habairtí ginte úsáidí agus bríonna éagsúla na bhfocal spriocdhírithe seo a léiriú. D’fhéadfadh cúlraí agus leibhéil oideachais éagsúla a bheith ag léitheoirí spriocdhírithe freisin. Tá sé riachtanach abairtí samplacha a chruthú a bheidh intuigthe do chúlraí éagsúla agus do leibhéil éagsúla lucht féachana. Chun na fadhbanna seo a réiteach, molaimid múnla inrialaithe atá feasach ar spriocfhocail don tasc seo. Is féidir lenár múnla molta samplaí réasúnta a ghiniúint d’fhocail spriocdhírithe, fiú d’fhocail iolracha. Ina theannta sin, ligeann ár múnla d’úsáideoirí smacht follasach a sholáthar ar shaintréithe a bhaineann le hinléiteacht, amhail fad agus castacht léacsach, rud a ghintear samplaí oiriúnacha do lucht féachana spriocdhírithe. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna ar thacar sonraí fhoclóir Oxford gur féidir lenár múnla samplaí oiriúnacha a ghiniúint d’fhocail spriocdhírithe le sainmhínithe sonracha agus an inléiteacht inmhianaithe a bhaint amach ag an am céanna.', 'ka': 'სიტყვანში მინიშვნელოვანი სიტყვებისთვის მაგალითი სიტყვების მაგალითი პროლია, რომელიც კითხველების გამოყენების შესაძლებელად გახსნა. რპაეთციონალურად, სიტყვანში მაგალითად სიტყვანში სიტყვანის გამოსახულებლად ლენგურისტიკის ექსპერტებით შექმნა, რომლებიც სამუშაო-ინტენსტიგური ამ დოკუმენში ჩვენ შევცვალოთ სიტყვანის მაგალითად სიტყვანის პრობლემა, რომელიც მინდა ავტომატურად წარმოიქმნა სიტყვანის მაგალითად სიტყვანის მაგალითად სიტყვანი ეს დავალება განსაკუთრებულია პოლისემის სიტყვებისთვის, რადგან შექმნილი სიტყვები უნდა გამოყენება განსხვავებული გამოყენება და განსაკუთრებული სიტყვებისთვის. მისაღებული კითხველი შეიძლება ასევე განსხვავებული ფონდა და განსწავლებელი დონე. მნიშვნელოვანია მაგალითების შექმნა, რომლებიც შეიძლება განსხვავებული ფონდა და აუდიტორიების დონეზე გავიგოთ. ამ პრობლემების გარეშე, ჩვენ კონტროლურად მისაღების სიტყვების მოდელს მივიღებთ. ჩვენი მოდელი შეიძლება გავიქმნა პარამეტრებული მაგალითები მისაღებული სიტყვებისთვის, მაგრამ პოლისმემური სიტყვებისთვის. დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელის მომხმარებელი შესაძლებელია გამოსახულებელი კონტროლის ატრიბუტების შესახებ, როგორც სიგრძე და ლექსიკალური კომპლექციელობა, ამიტომ მისახულ ავტომატიკური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებების მონაცემების შესახებ ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებელი მაგალითების შესაძლებელი მაგალითები მოქმედება, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებით გან', 'hu': 'A szótárban található célzott szavakra vonatkozó példamondatok fontos szerepet játszanak abban, hogy az olvasók megértsék a szavak használatát. Hagyományosan a szótárban található példamondatokat általában nyelvészeti szakértők hozzák létre, amelyek munkaigényesek és tudásintenzívak. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a szótárpélda mondat generálásának problémáját, azzal a céllal, hogy a megfelelő definíciók szerint automatikusan létrehozzuk a szótárpélda mondatokat célzott szavakhoz. Ez a feladat kihívást jelent különösen a többszörös szavak esetében, mert a létrehozott mondatoknak tükrözniük kell a célzott szavak különböző használatát és jelentését. A célzott olvasók különböző hátterűek és oktatási szintek is lehetnek. Alapvető fontosságú példamondatok létrehozása, amelyek a különböző hátterek és közönségszintek számára érthetőek. E problémák megoldása érdekében egy irányítható célszó-tudatos modellt javasolunk erre a feladatra. Javasolt modellünk ésszerű példákat hozhat létre célzott szavakra, akár többszörös szavakra is. Ezenkívül modellünk lehetővé teszi a felhasználók számára, hogy kifejezetten ellenőrizzék az olvashatósághoz kapcsolódó attribútumokat, mint például a hossz és a lexikai összetettség, így megfelelő példákat hozzanak létre a célzott közönségek számára. Az oxfordi szótár adatkészletén végzett automatikus és emberi értékelések azt mutatják, hogy modellünk megfelelő példákat képes létrehozni a célzott szavakhoz konkrét definíciókkal, miközben megfelel a kívánt olvashatóságnak.', 'el': 'Παραδείγματα προτάσεων για στοχευμένες λέξεις σε ένα λεξικό παίζουν σημαντικό ρόλο για να βοηθήσουν τους αναγνώστες να κατανοήσουν τη χρήση των λέξεων. Παραδοσιακά, παραδειγματικές προτάσεις σε ένα λεξικό συνήθως δημιουργούνται από ειδικούς γλωσσολογίας, οι οποίοι είναι εντατικοί στην εργασία και εντατικοί στη γνώση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε το πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας πρότασης παραδειγμάτων λεξικού, με στόχο την αυτόματη δημιουργία πρότασης παραδειγμάτων λεξικού για στοχευμένες λέξεις σύμφωνα με τους αντίστοιχους ορισμούς. Αυτό το έργο είναι δύσκολο ειδικά για πολυσυναισθηματικές λέξεις, επειδή οι δημιουργημένες προτάσεις πρέπει να αντικατοπτρίζουν διαφορετικές χρήσεις και έννοιες αυτών των στοχευμένων λέξεων. Οι στοχευμένοι αναγνώστες μπορεί επίσης να έχουν διαφορετικό υπόβαθρο και εκπαιδευτικά επίπεδα. Είναι σημαντικό να δημιουργηθούν παραδειγματικές προτάσεις που μπορούν να είναι κατανοητές για διαφορετικά υπόβαθρα και επίπεδα κοινού. Για την επίλυση αυτών των προβλημάτων, προτείνουμε ένα ελεγχόμενο μοντέλο συνειδητής λέξης-στόχου για αυτό το έργο. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μπορεί να δημιουργήσει λογικά παραδείγματα για στοχευμένες λέξεις, ακόμα και για πολυσυναισθηματικές λέξεις. Επιπλέον, το μοντέλο μας επιτρέπει στους χρήστες να παρέχουν ρητό έλεγχο των χαρακτηριστικών που σχετίζονται με την αναγνωσιμότητα, όπως το μήκος και η λεξική πολυπλοκότητα, δημιουργώντας έτσι κατάλληλα παραδείγματα για στοχευμένα ακροατήρια. Οι αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις στο σύνολο δεδομένων λεξικού της Οξφόρδης δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να δημιουργήσει κατάλληλα παραδείγματα για στοχευμένες λέξεις με συγκεκριμένους ορισμούς, ενώ παράλληλα ικανοποιεί την επιθυμητή αναγνωσιμότητα.', 'it': "Frasi di esempio per parole mirate in un dizionario svolgono un ruolo importante per aiutare i lettori a capire l'uso delle parole. Tradizionalmente, le frasi di esempio in un dizionario sono di solito create da esperti di linguistica, che sono ad alta intensità di lavoro e conoscenza. In questo articolo, presentiamo il problema della generazione di frasi di esempio di dizionario, con l'obiettivo di generare automaticamente frasi di esempio di dizionario per parole mirate secondo le definizioni corrispondenti. Questo compito è impegnativo soprattutto per le parole polisemous, perché le frasi generate devono riflettere usi e significati diversi di queste parole mirate. I lettori mirati possono anche avere background e livelli educativi diversi. È essenziale generare frasi di esempio che possano essere comprensibili per diversi background e livelli di pubblico. Per risolvere questi problemi, proponiamo un modello controllabile target-word-aware per questo compito. Il nostro modello proposto può generare esempi ragionevoli per parole mirate, anche per parole polisemose. Inoltre, il nostro modello consente agli utenti di fornire un controllo esplicito sugli attributi relativi alla leggibilità, come lunghezza e complessità lessicale, generando così esempi adatti per un pubblico mirato. Valutazioni automatiche e umane sul set di dati del dizionario Oxford mostrano che il nostro modello può generare esempi adatti per parole mirate con definizioni specifiche, soddisfacendo al contempo la leggibilità desiderata.", 'mk': 'Примери на реченици за насочени зборови во речникот играат важна улога за да им помогнат на читателите да го разберат употребата на зборови. Традиционално, речениците на пример во речникот обично се создаваат од експерти за јазик, кои се интензивни на работна сила и на знаење. Во овој весник, го воведуваме проблемот со генерацијата на реченици на пример на реченици, со цел автоматски да генерираме реченици на пример на реченици за насочени зборови според соодветните дефиниции. Оваа задача е предизвикувачка особено за полисемските зборови, бидејќи генерираните реченици мора да одразат различни употреби и значења на овие насочени зборови. Целбените читатели, исто така, можат да имаат различни основи и образовни нивоа. Неопходно е да се генерираат примери на реченици кои можат да бидат разбирливи за различни позадини и нивоа на публика. За да ги решиме овие проблеми, предлагаме контролиран модел со свесност на цел-збор за оваа задача. Нашиот предложен модел може да генерира разумни примери за насочени зборови, дури и за полисемни зборови. Покрај тоа, нашиот модел им овозможува на корисниците да обезбедат експлицитна контрола над атрибутите поврзани со читливоста, како што се должината и лексикалната комплексност, со што се генерираат соодветни примери за насочена публика. Автоматски и човечки проценки на наборот на податоци на речникот Оксфорд покажуваат дека нашиот модел може да генерира соодветни примери за насочени зборови со специфични дефиниции, додека се исполнува желбата за читање.', 'ms': 'Contoh kalimat untuk perkataan sasaran dalam kamus bermain peran penting untuk membantu pembaca memahami penggunaan perkataan. Secara tradisional, kalimat contoh dalam kamus biasanya dicipta oleh ahli bahasa, yang adalah kerja-intensiv dan pengetahuan-intensiv. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan masalah generasi kalimat contoh kamus, bertujuan untuk secara automatik menghasilkan kalimat contoh kamus untuk perkataan sasaran menurut definisi yang sepadan. Tugas ini menantang terutama untuk perkataan polisemus, kerana kalimat yang dijana perlu mencerminkan penggunaan dan makna yang berbeza bagi perkataan sasaran ini. Targeted readers may also have different backgrounds and educational levels.  Ia penting untuk menghasilkan kalimat contoh yang boleh dipahami untuk latar belakang dan tahap penonton yang berbeza. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini, kami melamar model yang boleh dikawal sasaran-kata-sedar untuk tugas ini. Model kami yang diusulkan boleh menghasilkan contoh yang masuk akal untuk kata-kata tertarik, walaupun untuk kata-kata polisemus. Selain itu, model kami membenarkan pengguna untuk menyediakan kawalan eksplicit atas atribut berkaitan dengan pembacaan, seperti panjang dan kompleksiti leksikal, dengan cara menghasilkan contoh yang sesuai untuk penonton sasaran. Evaluasi automatik dan manusia pada set data kamus Oxford menunjukkan bahawa model kita boleh menghasilkan contoh yang sesuai untuk perkataan sasaran dengan takrifan khusus semasa memenuhi pembacaan yang diinginkan.', 'lt': 'Pavyzdžiui, žodyno tikslinių žodžių sakiniai atlieka svarbų vaidmenį, kad padėtų skaitytojams suprasti žodžių naudojimą. Tradiciškai žodyno pavyzdžius paprastai sukuria kalbos ekspertai, kuriems reikia daug darbo ir žinių. Šiame dokumente įvedame žodyno pavyzdžių sukūrimo problem ą, kuria siekiama automatiškai sukurti žodyno pavyzdžių sakinius tiksliniams žodžiams pagal atitinkamas apibrėžtis. Ši užduotis ypač sunki polizeiškiems žodžiams, nes sukaupti sakiniai turi atspindėti skirtingą šių tikslinių žodžių naudojimą ir reikšmę. Tiksliniai skaitytojai taip pat gali turėti skirtingą pagrindą ir švietimo lygį. Būtina parengti pavyzdžius skirtingoms visuomenės aplinkybėms ir lygiams suprantamus sakinius. Siekiant išspręsti šias problemas, siūlome kontroliuojamą tikslinio žodžio model į šiam uždaviniui. Mūsų siūlomas modelis gali suteikti pagrįstų pavyzdžių tiksliniams žodžiams, net ir polizieminiams žodžiams. Be to, mūsų modelis suteikia galimybę naudotojams aiškiai kontroliuoti su skaitomumu susijusius požymius, pvz., ilgį ir lexinį sudėtingumą, taip sukuriant tinkamus pavyzdžius tikslinei auditorijai. Automatiniai ir žmogiškieji Oxford žodyno duomenų rinkinio vertinimai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali sukurti tinkamus pavyzdžius tiksliniams žodžiams su konkrečiomis apibrėžtimis ir kartu atitikti pageidaujamą skaitomumą.', 'kk': 'Сөздігінде мақсатты сөздер үшін мысал сөздер оқушыларға сөздерді түсінуге көмектесу үшін мақсатты роль ойлады. Дәстүрлі, сөздіктегі сөздер әдетте лингвистикалық эксперттер құрылады, бұл жұмыс-тең және білім-тең. Бұл қағазда сөздік мәселесін құру үшін, сөздік мәселесін автоматты түрде мақсатты сөздер үшін мәселелерді құру үшін таңдаймыз. Бұл тапсырма, осылай қатар, полиземді сөздер үшін қиын көмектеседі, себебі құрылған сөздер осы мақсатты сөздердің әртүрлі пайдалануларын және мақсатты мәліметтерін көрсе Мақсатты оқушылар әртүрлі аясы мен білім беру деңгейі болуы мүмкін. Түрлі аясы мен аудиторияның деңгейін түсінікті мәселелерді құру үшін маңызды. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, бұл тапсырма үшін басқару үшін мақсатты сөздерді түсіну үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біздің келтірілген үлгіміз мақсатты сөздер үшін, сондай-ақ, полизмді сөздер үшін, мәселелерді жасай алады. Қосымша, біздің үлгіміз пайдаланушылардың оқу мүмкіндіктерінің атрибуттарын, ұзындығы мен лексикалық тәжірибесі секілді, бұл үшін мақсатталған аудиториялардың жақсы мысалдарын құр Оксфорд сөздік деректер жиынындағы автоматты және адамдардың оқу мүмкіндігін қалағанда, мақсатталған сөздер үшін мәселелер жасай алады дегенді көрсетеді.', 'mt': 'Eżempji ta’ sentenzi għal kliem immirat f’dikjararju għandhom rwol importanti biex jgħinu lill-qarrejja jifhmu l-użu tal-kliem. Tradizzjonalment, sentenzi eżempji f’dikjararju normalment jinħolqu minn esperti lingwistiċi, li huma intensivi fix-xogħol u intensivi fl-għarfien. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nintroduċu l-problema tal-ġenerazzjoni ta’ eżempji ta’ sentenzi ta’ dikjarazzjoni, bil-għan li jiġġeneraw awtomatikament sentenzi ta’ eżempju ta’ dikjarazzjoni għal kliem immirat skont id-definizzjonijiet korrispondenti. Dan il-kompitu huwa ta’ sfida speċjalment għall-kliem poliżimu, minħabba li s-sentenzi ġġenerati jeħtieġu jirriflettu użi u tifsiriet differenti ta’ dawn il-kliem immirati. Il-qarrejja mmirati jista’ jkollhom ukoll sfondi u livelli edukattivi differenti. Huwa essenzjali li jiġu ġġenerati sentenzi eżempji li jistgħu jinftiehmu għal sfondi u livelli differenti ta’ udjenzi. Biex jissolvew dawn il-problemi, qed nipproponu mudell kontrollabbli u konxju mill-kliem fil-mira għal dan il-kompitu. Il-mudell propost tagħna jista’ jiġġenera eżempji raġonevoli għal kliem immirat, anki għal kliem poliżimu. Barra minn hekk, il-mudell tagħna jippermetti lill-utenti jipprovdu kontroll espliċitu fuq attributi relatati mal-leġibbiltà, bħat-tul u l-kumplessità lexika, u b’hekk jiġġeneraw eżempji xierqa għall-udjenzi mmirati. Evalwazzjonijiet awtomatiċi u umani fuq is-sett tad-dejta tad-dikjaratorju ta’ Oxford juru li l-mudell tagħna jista’ jiġġenera eżempji xierqa għal kliem immirat b’definizzjonijiet speċifiċi filwaqt li jilħaq il-leġibbiltà mixtieqa.', 'no': 'Eksempel på setningar for målte ord i eit ordbok speler ein viktig rolle for å hjelpa lesarar å forstå bruken av ord. For eksempel setningar i eit ordbok blir vanlegvis oppretta av språk-ekspertar, som er arbeid-intensiv og kunnskap-intensiv. I denne papiret introduserer vi problemet med eksempel setningar for ordbok, med å automatisk laga ordbok for eksempel teikn for målte ord etter tilsvarande definisjonar. Denne oppgåva er vanskeleg spesielt for polysemiske ord, fordi dei genererte setningane må refleksera ulike brukar og meningar av desse målte ord. Målet lesarar kan også ha forskjellige bakgrunn og utdannelivå. Det er nødvendig å laga eksempel setningar som kan forstårast for ulike bakgrunn og nivå av publikum. For å løse desse problemene, foreslår vi ein kontrollerbart målordvare- modell for denne oppgåva. Vårt foreslått modell kan laga riktige eksemplar for målte ord, sjølv for polysemiske ord. I tillegg kan modellen våre brukarar gi eksplisitt kontroll over attributtar som er relatert til lesabilitet, slik som lengd og leksisk kompleksitet, slik at det gjer passande eksemplar for målgjende publikum. Automatiske og menneske evalueringar på Oxford- ordboksettet viser at modellen vårt kan laga passande eksemplar for målte ord med spesifikke definisjonar medan du møtar dei ønskte lesabiliteten.', 'ml': 'നിഘണ്ടിയില്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഉദാഹരണമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് വാക്കുകളുടെ ഉപയോഗം മനസ്സി ഒരു നിഘണ്ടത്തിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി ഭാഷകശാസ്ത്രീകളാല്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. അത് ജോലിക്കുന്നതും ജ്ഞാനവും ഉള്ളതുമാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിഘണ്ടിയുടെ ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്റെ തലമുറയുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d അനുസരിച്ച് നി ഈ ജോലി പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. കാരണം ജനിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക് ആഗ്രഹിക്കപ്പെട്ട വായിക്കാര്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യസ്ത പശ്ചാത്തലങ്ങളും വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ നിലങ്ങള വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പശ്ചാത്തലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും നിലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതാണ് അതി ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d, ഈ ജോലിക്ക് നിയന്ത്രിക്കാവുന്ന ലക്ഷ്യം വാക്ക്-വാക്ക് അറിയുന്ന മോ നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വ്യക്തമായ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d  കൂടാതെ, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് വായിക്കാവുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക വ്യക്തമായ നിയന്ത്രണം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. നീളം, ലെക്സിക് ഓക്സ്ഫോര്\u200dഡിന്റെ നിഘണ്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സ്വയം മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന വായിക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുമുട്ടുമ്', 'mn': 'Уншигчид үгийг ойлгохын тулд зориулагдсан үгсийн жишээлүүд нь чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Үүний хувьд хэл хэлний мэргэжилтнүүд илэрхийлэгддэг жишээлүүд нь ажлын хүчтэй, мэдлэг хүчтэй байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өгүүлбэрийн жишээ нь өгүүлбэрийн төлөвлөгөөний асуудлыг автоматаар өгүүлбэрийн жишээ бий болгохын тулд зориулагдсан үгнүүдийн жишээ бий болгох зориулагдсан юм. Энэ даалгавар нь ялангуяа олон үгүүдийн тухай шаардлагатай. Учир нь үүсгэсэн үгүүд эдгээр зориулагдсан үгүүдийн өөр хэрэглээ болон утгыг харуулах хэрэгтэй. Цаг зориулсан уншигчид мөн өөр түвшинд, боловсролын түвшинд байж магадгүй. Үүнийг олон түвшинд болон сонсогчидын түвшинд ойлгох боломжтой жишээлүүд бий болгох нь чухал. Эдгээр асуудлуудыг шийдэхийн тулд бид энэ үйл ажилд удирдлагатай зорилготой үг ойлгох загварыг санал болно. Бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь зориулагдсан үгсийн жишээг бүр олон үгсийн тухай бий болгодог. Мөн бидний загвар нь хэрэглэгчид унших чадвартай холбоотой атрибутыг тодорхой удирдах боломжтой болгодог. Яг урт болон лексикийн төвөгтэй байдал, тэгэхээр зориулагдсан сонсогчид зөв жишээ гаргадаг. Оксфорд хэлний өгөгдлийн сангийн автоматически болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнууд бидний загварын загвар нь хүссэн унших чадвартай холбоотой тодорхойлолтой үгсийг тодорхойлж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Przykładowe zdania dla słów docelowych w słowniku odgrywają ważną rolę, aby pomóc czytelnikom zrozumieć użycie słów. Tradycyjnie przykładowe zdania w słowniku są zwykle tworzone przez ekspertów lingwistyki, którzy są pracochłonni i wymagają wiedzy. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy problem generowania przykładowych zdań słownikowych, mający na celu automatyczne generowanie przykładowych zdań słownikowych dla słów docelowych według odpowiednich definicji. To zadanie jest wyzwaniem zwłaszcza dla słów wieloosobowych, ponieważ generowane zdania muszą odzwierciedlać różne zastosowania i znaczenia tych słów docelowych. Czytelnicy ukierunkowani mogą również mieć różne środowiska i poziomy edukacji. Istotne jest wygenerowanie przykładowych zdań, które mogą być zrozumiałe dla różnych środowisk i poziomów odbiorców. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy kontrolowany model świadomy słowa docelowe dla tego zadania. Proponowany przez nas model może generować rozsądne przykłady słów docelowych, nawet dla słów wieloosobowych. Ponadto nasz model pozwala użytkownikom zapewnić wyraźną kontrolę nad atrybutami związanymi z czytelnością, takimi jak długość i złożoność leksykalna, generując tym samym odpowiednie przykłady dla docelowych odbiorców. Automatyczne i ludzkie oceny na zbiorze danych słownika Oxford pokazują, że nasz model może generować odpowiednie przykłady dla słów docelowych o określonych definicjach przy jednoczesnym spełnieniu pożądanej czytelności.', 'ro': 'Exemplu de propoziții pentru cuvinte vizate într-un dicționar joacă un rol important pentru a ajuta cititorii să înțeleagă utilizarea cuvintelor. În mod tradițional, propozițiile de exemplu dintr-un dicționar sunt de obicei create de experți lingvistici, care necesită muncă intensivă și cunoaștere intensivă. În această lucrare, introducem problema generarii de propoziții de exemplu dicționar, având ca scop generarea automată de propoziții de exemplu dicționar pentru cuvintele vizate conform definițiilor corespunzătoare. Această sarcină este provocatoare în special pentru cuvintele polisemoase, deoarece propozițiile generate trebuie să reflecte diferite utilizări și semnificații ale acestor cuvinte vizate. Cititorii vizați pot avea, de asemenea, medii diferite și niveluri educaționale. Este esențial să se genereze propoziții de exemplu care pot fi înțelese pentru diferite medii și niveluri de public. Pentru a rezolva aceste probleme, propunem un model controlabil pentru această sarcină. Modelul nostru propus poate genera exemple rezonabile pentru cuvinte vizate, chiar și pentru cuvinte polisemoase. În plus, modelul nostru permite utilizatorilor să ofere control explicit asupra atributelor legate de lizibilitate, cum ar fi lungimea și complexitatea lexicală, generând astfel exemple adecvate pentru publicul vizat. Evaluările automate și umane ale setului de date al dicționarului Oxford arată că modelul nostru poate genera exemple adecvate pentru cuvinte vizate cu definiții specifice, în timp ce îndeplinește lizibilitatea dorită.', 'sr': 'Primjer rečenica za ciljane reči u rečniku igraju važnu ulogu za pomoć čitačima da razumeju korištenje reči. Tradicionalno, primjerne rečenice u rečniku obično stvaraju lingvistički stručnjaci, koji su intenzivni i znanstveni. U ovom papiru predstavljamo problem generacije rečenica primjera rečenica, ciljanje automatski proizvesti primjerne rečenice za ciljane reči u skladu s odgovarajućim definicijama. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan posebno za polizemne reči, jer proizvedene rečenice moraju odrediti različite korištenja i smisao tih ciljnih reči. Ciljni čitači takođe mogu imati različite pozadine i razine obrazovanja. Važno je stvoriti primjerne rečenice koje mogu razumjeti za različite pozadine i nivoe publika. Da bi riješili te probleme, predlažemo kontrolni model svesnog ciljeva za ovaj zadatak. Naš predloženi model može stvoriti razumne primjere za ciljane reči, čak i za polizemne reči. Osim toga, naš model omogućava korisnicima da pruže ekskluzivnu kontrolu nad atributima povezanim sa čitljivošću, kao što su dužina i leksička kompleksnost, tako stvarajući odgovarajuće primjere za ciljne publike. Automatske i ljudske procjene na setu podataka o Oxfordu rečnika pokazuju da naš model može stvoriti odgovarajuće primjere za ciljane reči sa specifičnim definicijama dok ispunjavamo željenu čitljivost.', 'si': 'කියවන්න පාළුවන්ට වචන භාවිත තේරුම් ගන්න උදව් කරන්න ලක්ෂණ වචන් වලට උදාහරණය කරන්න. සාමාන්\u200dය විදියටම, භාෂාවික විශ්වාසිකයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසිකයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ව්\u200dයාපාර මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, සම්බන්ධ වි මේ වැඩේ විශේෂයෙන් පොලිසිම් වචන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අදහස්  ඉලක්කම් කියවන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් පිටිපස්සේ සහ ශික්ෂාව ස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා. ඒක අවශ්\u200dයයි, උදාහරණ වචනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම වෙනස් පිටිපස්සේ සහ ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයන්ගේ ස්ථානය සඳ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න, අපි පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ලක්ෂණ වචන වචන පරීක්ෂණයක් මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට ලක්කුණු වචන් වලට හොඳ උදාහරණ උපදේශයක් නිර්මාණය කරන් ඒ වගේම, අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට පැහැදිලි පාලනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ පාලනය සඳහා පාලනය සඳහා පැහැදිලි ස ඔක්ස්ෆර්ඩ් ඩිකොර්ඩ් ඩේටාබේස් සටහනේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් අපේ මොඩල් සිද්ධ විශේ', 'so': 'Example sentences for targeted words in a dictionary play an important role to help readers understand the usage of words.  Sida caadiga ah waxaa lagu sameeyaa qeybaha ku qoran luqada, kuwaas oo ah aqoonta koronta iyo koronta shaqada. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa dhibaatada tusaale ahaan xafiiska luqada, kaas oo si rasmi ah ugu talo gala tusaale ahaan erayo la jeedo oo lagu qoray si waafaqsan qeybta ku qoran. Shaqoonkaasu waa dhibaato khaas ah hadallada badan, sababtoo ah erayada la soo dhashay waa in ay ku fikiraan isticmaalyo kala duduwan iyo micnahooda hadalladan la hagaajiyey. Waxbarashada waxaa sidoo kale laga yaabaa in qofka wax akhriya ay leeyihiin sababo kala duduwan iyo heerar waxbarasho. Waxaa muhiim ah in aad sameyn karto qoraalo tusaale ah oo lagu garan karo sababaha kala duwan iyo heerarka dhegaha. Si aan u xallino dhibaatadan, waxan shaqada u soo jeedno model maamul ah oo la ilaaliyo hadal-aqoon leh. Tusaale la soo jeeday wuxuu sameyn karaa tusaalo wanaagsan oo ay u eg yihiin hadalo la hagaajiyey, xataa hadalo badan. Sidoo kale modellkayaga ayaa isticmaalayaasha u ogolaa in ay u fidiyaan maamul cad oo ku saabsan qalabka akhriska, tusaale ahaan dhererka iyo dhibaatada lexicka, oo ay sameynayso tusaalooyin haboon oo ay u eg yihiin dhaqaalaha dhegilaha la hagayo. Qiimeynta iskaa ah iyo waxyaabaha dadku waxay ka muuqan karaan in modellkayagu uu sameyn karo tusaalooyin eg oo ku haboon hadallada la hagayo oo ku qoran qoraal cayiman marka la kulmo awoodda loo baahan yahay.', 'sv': 'Exempelmeningar för riktade ord i en ordbok spelar en viktig roll för att hjälpa läsarna att förstå användningen av ord. Traditionellt skapas exempelmeningar i en ordbok vanligtvis av lingvistiska experter, som är arbetsintensiva och kunskapsintensiva. I denna uppsats introducerar vi problemet med ordlista exempel meningsgenerering, som syftar till att automatiskt generera ordlista exempel meningar för riktade ord enligt motsvarande definitioner. Denna uppgift är utmanande särskilt för polyemous ord, eftersom de genererade meningarna måste återspegla olika användningsområden och betydelser av dessa riktade ord. Riktade läsare kan också ha olika bakgrunder och utbildningsnivåer. Det är viktigt att generera exempelmeningar som kan vara begripliga för olika bakgrunder och nivåer av publik. För att lösa dessa problem föreslår vi en kontrollerbar målordmedveten modell för denna uppgift. Vår föreslagna modell kan generera rimliga exempel på riktade ord, även för polyemous ord. Dessutom ger vår modell användare möjlighet att ge explicit kontroll över attribut relaterade till läsbarhet, såsom längd och lexikal komplexitet, vilket genererar lämpliga exempel för riktade målgrupper. Automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar av Oxford ordbok dataset visar att vår modell kan generera lämpliga exempel för riktade ord med specifika definitioner samtidigt som den uppfyller önskad läsbarhet.', 'ta': 'ஒரு அகராதியில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட சொற்களுக்கு உதாரணமான வாக்கியங்கள் வாசிக்கப்பட்ட முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகி ஒரு அகராதியில் உள்ள வாக்கியங்கள் வழக்கமாக மொழிப்பெயர்களால் உருவாக்கப்படுகின்றன, இது வேலை மிகவும் உறுதியான மற்றும் அறிவு  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் அகராதி உதாரணமான வாக்கு தலைமுறையின் பிரச்சனையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், பொருத்தமுடைய விளக்கங்களை பொருத்தி ச இந்த செயல் பலவிதமான வார்த்தைகளுக்கு சவாலானதாக இருக்கிறது, ஏனென்றால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்கள் வெவ்வேறு பயன்பாடு குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட படிப்பாளர்களுக்கு வேறு பின்னணி மற்றும் கல்வி நிலைகள் இருக்கலாம். வேறு பின்னணி மற்றும் பார்வைகளின் நிலைகளுக்கு புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் உதாரணத்தின் வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக் இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய, இந்த பணிக்கு நாம் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட இலக்கு- வார்த்தை உணர்ந்த மாதிர எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி இலக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளுக்கு நிர்ணயான உதாரணங்களை உருவாக்க முடிய மேலும், எங்கள் மாதிரி பயனர்கள் படிக்கும் குணங்களின் குணங்களின் மீது வெளிப்படையான கட்டுப்பாடு Oxford அகராதி தகவல் அமைப்பில் தன்னியக்கமாக மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பீடுகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் மாதிரி தேவைப்படும் படிக்கும் போது குறிப்பிட', 'ur': 'لکھنے والوں کی استعمال سمجھنے کے لئے ایک لکھنے والے لکھنے کے لئے مثال جماعتوں کا ایک اہم رول ہے۔ آسانی طور پر، ایک لکھائی میں مثال لکھائی معمولاً زبان شناسی دانشمندوں کے ذریعہ پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں، جو عملہ کے مطابق اور علم کے مطابق ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم کلیسا کی مثال جماعت کی مسئلہ پیش کریں گے، جس کا ارادہ ہے کہ کلیسا کے مطابق موجود کلیسا کے لئے موجود کلیسا کے مطابق موجود کریں۔ یہ کام مخصوصاً بہت سی کلمات کے لئے مشکل ہے، کیونکہ پیدا کئے ہوئے کلمات کی مختلف استعمال اور مطلوبات کو دکھانے کی ضرورت ہے۔ موجب پڑھنے والے بھی مختلف پچھلے اور تعلیم سطح مل سکتے ہیں۔ مثال جماعتیں پیدا کرنے کی ضرورت ہے جن کو مختلف پکنے کے سبب اور سنانے کے سطح کے لئے سمجھ سکتے ہیں. یہ مشکلات حل کرنے کے لئے، ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک کنٹرول قابل ہدایت واقف موڈل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا مدل مقررہ کلمات کے لئے منطقی مثالیں پیدا کر سکتا ہے، اگرچہ بہت سی کلمات کے لئے۔ اس کے علاوہ ہماری مدل کارساز کو پڑھنے کی طاقت کے متعلق خاص کنٹرول کے لئے اجازت دیتا ہے، جیسے طول اور لکسیکی پیچیدگی، اسی طرح موجود اڈیوس کے لئے مناسب مثالیں پیدا کرتا ہے۔ آکسفورڈ ڈیسا سٹ کے ذریعے آٹوٹی اور انسان کی ارزیابی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے موڈل کے لئے مطابق مطابق مثالیں پیدا کر سکتے ہیں، جبکہ وہ خواہش کی پڑھنے کی طاقت حاصل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info Масалан, масалан, луғатдаги сўзлар одатда тил маълумотлар томонидан яратилади, бу жараёнинг жиддий ва илм жиҳатий сифатида. Bu hujjatda, biz murakkab qiladigan fikrlarni ifodalar bilan foydalanish uchun lugʻatni avtomatik yaratish mumkin. Bu vazifa polysemiz so'zlari uchun murakkab qiladi, chunki umumiy so'zlar tuziladigan so'zlarni boshqa foydalanuvchi va ma'nolarni tasavvur qilishi kerak. Koʻrsatiladigan oʻquvchilar ham turli orqa fon va ta'lim darajasi bo'lishi mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Bu muammolarni solish uchun, bu vazifa uchun boshqaruvchining boshqaruv maqsad-soʻzni tahlil qilish modelini davom qilamiz. Our proposed model can generate reasonable examples for targeted words, even for polysemous words.  Ko'pchilik, modelimiz foydalanuvchilarni oʻqish xossalarining xususiyatlarini aniqlash imkoniyatini beradi. Bunday qilib, uzunlik va leksikal murakkablarini ham qisqa misollar yaratishga ruxsat beradi. Name", 'vi': 'Ví dụ câu dành cho các từ mục tiêu trong từ điển đóng một vai trò quan trọng để giúp độc giả hiểu cách sử dụng các từ. Theo truyền thống, câu ví dụ trong từ điển thường được tạo ra bởi các chuyên gia ngôn ngữ, chuyên về sức lao động và kiến thức. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu vấn đề sản xuất từ điển trường câu, nhằm mục đích tự động tạo ra các câu điển hình cho các từ điển nhắm theo các định nghĩa tương ứng. Nhiệm vụ này thách thức đặc biệt với những từ đa dạng, bởi vì các câu đã tạo ra cần phải phản ánh sự sử dụng và ý nghĩa khác nhau của những từ mục tiêu này. Học giả có thể có nền tảng khác nhau và cấp độ giáo dục. Đó là điều cần thiết để tạo ra những câu ví dụ có thể dễ hiểu được về tầng lớp khác nhau và khán giả. Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp nghe từ mục tiêu. Một kiểu mẫu như chúng ta có thể tạo ra những ví dụ hợp lý cho những từ mục tiêu, kể cả ngôn ngữ dạng. Hơn nữa, mô hình của chúng tôi cho phép người dùng kiểm soát rõ ràng các thuộc tính dễ đọc, như độ dài và độ phức tạp ngôn ngữ, tạo ra ví dụ phù hợp cho các thính giả. Bản đánh giá tự động và con người trên bộ dữ liệu từ điển Oxford cho thấy rằng mô hình của chúng tôi có thể tạo ra ví dụ phù hợp cho những từ ngữ cụ thể với những định nghĩa cụ thể, trong khi hài lòng dễ đọc được.', 'bg': 'Примерни изречения за целеви думи в речник играят важна роля, за да помогнат на читателите да разберат използването на думи. Традиционно примерните изречения в речника обикновено се създават от експерти по лингвистика, които са трудоемки и знания. В тази статия представяме проблема с генерирането на речник примерни изречения, с цел автоматично генериране на речник примерни изречения за целеви думи според съответните дефиниции. Тази задача е предизвикателна особено за многослойни думи, тъй като генерираните изречения трябва да отразяват различни употреби и значения на тези целеви думи. Целеви читатели също могат да имат различен произход и образователни нива. От съществено значение е да се генерират примерни изречения, които могат да бъдат разбираеми за различни фонове и нива на аудитория. За решаване на тези проблеми предлагаме контролируем модел на целева дума за тази задача. Нашият предложен модел може да генерира разумни примери за целеви думи, дори и за многослойни думи. Освен това нашият модел позволява на потребителите да предоставят изричен контрол върху атрибутите, свързани с четливостта, като дължина и лексикална сложност, като по този начин генерират подходящи примери за целеви аудитории. Автоматични и човешки оценки на набора от данни от речника Оксфорд показват, че нашият модел може да генерира подходящи примери за целеви думи със специфични дефиниции, като същевременно отговаря на желаната четливост.', 'nl': 'Voorbeeldzinnen voor gerichte woorden in een woordenboek spelen een belangrijke rol om lezers te helpen het gebruik van woorden te begrijpen. Traditioneel worden voorbeeldzinnen in een woordenboek meestal gemaakt door taalkundigen, die arbeidsintensief en kennisintensief zijn. In dit artikel introduceren we het probleem van het genereren van woordenboek voorbeeldzinnen, gericht op het automatisch genereren van woordenboek voorbeeldzinnen voor gerichte woorden volgens de overeenkomstige definities. Deze taak is vooral uitdagend voor meerstemmige woorden, omdat de gegenereerde zinnen verschillende toepassingen en betekenissen van deze doelgerichte woorden moeten weerspiegelen. Gerichte lezers kunnen ook verschillende achtergronden en opleidingsniveaus hebben. Het is essentieel om voorbeeldzinnen te genereren die begrijpelijk zijn voor verschillende achtergronden en niveaus van publiek. Om deze problemen op te lossen, stellen we een beheersbaar target-word-aware model voor deze taak voor. Ons voorgestelde model kan redelijke voorbeelden genereren voor gerichte woorden, zelfs voor meerstemmige woorden. Daarnaast stelt ons model gebruikers in staat om expliciete controle te geven over kenmerken gerelateerd aan leesbaarheid, zoals lengte en lexicale complexiteit, waardoor geschikte voorbeelden worden gegenereerd voor doelgroepen. Automatische en menselijke evaluaties op de Oxford woordenboek dataset laten zien dat ons model geschikte voorbeelden kan genereren voor gerichte woorden met specifieke definities terwijl de gewenste leesbaarheid wordt bereikt.', 'da': 'Eksempelssætninger for målrettede ord i en ordbog spiller en vigtig rolle for at hjælpe læserne med at forstå brugen af ord. Traditionelt er eksempelsætninger i en ordbog normalt skabt af lingvistiske eksperter, som er arbejdskraftintensive og videnintensive. I denne artikel introducerer vi problemet med ordbogseksempel sætningsgenerering, der sigter mod automatisk at generere ordbogseksempel sætninger for målrettede ord i henhold til de tilsvarende definitioner. Denne opgave er især udfordrende for polystemøse ord, fordi de genererede sætninger skal afspejle forskellige anvendelser og betydninger af disse målrettede ord. Målrettede læsere kan også have forskellige baggrunde og uddannelsesniveauer. Det er vigtigt at generere eksempelssætninger, der kan være forståelige for forskellige baggrunde og niveauer af publikum. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi en kontrollerbar målordbevidst model for denne opgave. Vores foreslåede model kan generere rimelige eksempler på målrettede ord, selv for polystemøse ord. Desuden giver vores model brugerne mulighed for at give eksplicit kontrol over attributter relateret til læsbarhed, såsom længde og leksikalsk kompleksitet, og dermed generere egnede eksempler til målrettede målgrupper. Automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer af Oxford ordbog datasæt viser, at vores model kan generere egnede eksempler på målrettede ord med specifikke definitioner, samtidig med at den opfylder den ønskede læsbarhed.', 'de': 'Beispielsätze für bestimmte Wörter in einem Wörterbuch spielen eine wichtige Rolle, um den Lesern zu helfen, die Verwendung von Wörtern zu verstehen. Traditionell werden Beispielsätze in einem Wörterbuch meist von Linguistikern erstellt, die arbeits- und wissensintensiv sind. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir das Problem der Generierung von Wörterbuchbeispielsätzen vor, mit dem Ziel, automatisch Wörterbuchbeispielsätze für Zielwörter gemäß den entsprechenden Definitionen zu generieren. Diese Aufgabe ist besonders für polyemotionale Wörter eine Herausforderung, da die generierten Sätze unterschiedliche Verwendungen und Bedeutungen dieser Zielwörter widerspiegeln müssen. Zielgerichtete Leser können auch unterschiedliche Hintergründe und Bildungsniveaus haben. Es ist wichtig, Beispielsätze zu generieren, die für unterschiedliche Hintergründe und Zielgruppen verständlich sind. Um diese Probleme zu lösen, schlagen wir ein steuerbares Target-Word-bewusstes Modell für diese Aufgabe vor. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell kann sinnvolle Beispiele für Zielwörter generieren, auch für polyemotionale Wörter. Darüber hinaus ermöglicht unser Modell den Nutzern eine explizite Kontrolle über Attribute im Zusammenhang mit der Lesbarkeit, wie Länge und lexikalische Komplexität, und generiert so geeignete Beispiele für Zielgruppen. Automatische und menschliche Auswertungen auf dem Oxford Wörterbuch Datensatz zeigen, dass unser Modell geeignete Beispiele für gezielte Wörter mit spezifischen Definitionen generieren kann, während die gewünschte Lesbarkeit erreicht wird.', 'id': 'Contoh kalimat untuk kata-kata tertarik dalam kamus bermain peran penting untuk membantu pembaca memahami penggunaan kata-kata. Secara tradisional, kalimat contoh dalam kamus biasanya diciptakan oleh ahli bahasa, yang bekerja-intensiv dan pengetahuan-intensiv. In this paper, we introduce the problem of dictionary example sentence generation, aiming to automatically generate dictionary example sentences for targeted words according to the corresponding definitions.  Tugas ini menantang khususnya untuk kata-kata polisemus, karena kalimat yang dihasilkan perlu merefleksikan penggunaan dan makna yang berbeda dari kata-kata tersebut. Pembaca sasaran juga mungkin memiliki latar belakang dan tingkat pendidikan yang berbeda. Hal penting untuk menghasilkan contoh kalimat yang dapat dimengerti untuk latar belakang dan tingkat penonton yang berbeda. Untuk memecahkan masalah ini, kami mengusulkan model yang dapat dikendalikan target-word-aware untuk tugas ini. Model kami yang diusulkan dapat menghasilkan contoh yang masuk akal untuk kata-kata tertarik, bahkan untuk kata-kata polisemus. Selain itu, model kami memungkinkan pengguna untuk menyediakan kontrol eksplicit atas atribut yang berhubungan dengan pembacaan, seperti panjang dan kompleksitas lexik, sehingga menghasilkan contoh yang cocok untuk penonton yang ditujukan. Evaluasi otomatis dan manusia pada set data kamus Oxford menunjukkan bahwa model kita dapat menghasilkan contoh yang cocok untuk kata-kata yang ditujukan dengan definisi spesifik sementara memenuhi pembacaan yang diinginkan.', 'ko': '사전에서 목표어의 예문은 독자가 단어의 용법을 이해하는 데 중요한 역할을 한다.전통적으로 사전의 예문은 일반적으로 언어학 전문가가 창설하는데 이것은 노동집약형과 지식집약형이다.본고는 사전예문 생성 문제를 소개했는데 상응하는 정의에 따라 목표어를 자동으로 생성하는 사전예문을 목적으로 한다.이 임무는 다의어에게 특히 도전적이다. 왜냐하면 생성된 문장은 이러한 목표어의 서로 다른 용법과 의미를 반영해야 하기 때문이다.목표 독자도 서로 다른 배경과 교육 수준을 가질 수 있다.서로 다른 배경과 차원의 관중에게 이해할 수 있는 예문을 만드는 것은 매우 중요하다.이런 문제들을 해결하기 위해 우리는 통제할 수 있는 목표어 감지 모델을 제시했다.우리가 제시한 모델은 목표어에 합리적인 예, 심지어 다의어를 생성할 수 있다.또한 우리의 모델은 사용자가 가독성과 관련된 속성, 예를 들어 길이와 어휘의 복잡성을 명확하게 제어하여 목표 관중에게 적합한 예시를 생성할 수 있도록 한다.옥스포드 사전 데이터 집합의 자동과 인공 평가에 의하면 우리의 모델은 특정한 정의를 가진 목표어에 적합한 예시를 생성하고 필요한 가독성을 만족시킬 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Kwa mfano, hukumu kwa maneno yanayolengwa katika lugha inacheza jukumu muhimu la kuwasaidia wasomaji kuelewa matumizi ya maneno. Kwa kawaida, hukumu kwa mfano katika lugha mara nyingi zinatengenezwa na wataalam wa lugha, ambazo ni yenye nguvu na yenye ujuzi mkubwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha tatizo la kizazi cha hukumu ya kidictiona, kwa lengo la kutengeneza mifano ya lugha kwa ajili ya maneno yanayolengwa kwa mujibu wa maelezo yanayofanana. This task is challenging especially for polysemous words, because the generated sentences need to reflect different usages and meanings of these targeted words.  Wasomaji wenye lengo linaweza pia kuwa na misingi tofauti na viwango vya elimu. Ni muhimu kutengeneza sentensi za mfano ambazo zinaweza kuelewa kwa misingi tofauti na kiwango cha hadhira. Ili kutatua matatizo haya, tunapendekeza muundo wa kudhibitiwa kwa maneno yanayofahamika kwa kazi hii. Mfano wetu wa pendekezo unaweza kutengeneza mifano sahihi kwa maneno yanayolengwa, hata kwa maneno mengi. Zaidi ya hayo, mifano yetu inaruhusu watumiaji kutoa udhibiti wa wazi juu ya vipengele vinavyohusiana na uwezekano wa kusoma, kama vile lengo na utatibu wa hali ya lexico, kwa hiyo inatengeneza mifano mazuri kwa ajili ya watazamaji waliolengwa. Tathmini za kujitegemea na binadamu kwenye seti ya data za dictionary Oxford zinaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unaweza kutengeneza mifano sahihi kwa maneno yanayolengwa na ufafanuzi maalum wakati wa kukutana na uwezekano wa kusoma unaotaka.', 'hr': 'Primjer rečenica za ciljane riječi u rečniku igraju važnu ulogu za pomoć čitačima da razumiju korištenje riječi. Tradicionalno, primjerne rečenice u rečniku obično stvaraju lingvistički stručnjaci, koji su intenzivni i znanstveni. U ovom papiru predstavljamo problem generacije rečenica primjerice rečenica, čime se cilja automatski stvoriti primjerne rečenice za ciljane riječi u skladu s odgovarajućim definicijama. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan posebno za polizemne riječi, jer proizvedene rečenice moraju odražavati različite korištenje i smisla tih ciljnih riječi. Ciljni čitači također mogu imati različite pozadine i razine obrazovanja. Važno je proizvesti primjerne rečenice koje mogu razumjeti za različite pozadine i razine publike. Da bi riješili te probleme, predlažemo kontrolni model za ovaj zadatak. Naš predloženi model može stvoriti razumne primjere za ciljane riječi, čak i za polizemne riječi. Osim toga, naš model omogućava korisnicima da pruže jasnu kontrolu nad atributima povezanim s čitljivošću, kao što su dužina i leksička složenost, tako stvarajući odgovarajuće primjere za ciljne publike. Automatske i ljudske procjene u okviru podataka o riječniku Oxford pokazuju da naš model može stvoriti odgovarajuće primjere za ciljane riječi s specifičnim definicijama dok ispunjavamo željenu čitljivost.', 'tr': 'Bir sözlükde maksady sözler üçin örän wajyp sözleri oýnamak üçin oýnamak üçin okadçylara sözlerin ullanyşyny düşünmekde has baglanýar. Adatça, sözlükde örnekler köplenç dil uzmanlaryň tarapyndan döredilýär. Olar işi ýok we bilgi ýok. Bu kagyzda, sözlük döredilişi sözlük döredilişinde meselägi tanyşdyrýarys, sözlük sözlerini öz-özünden beýleki tanyşlara maksady sözleriň örän eserlerini döretmäge niýetlenýär. Bu zady örän köp sözler üçin kynçylyk edip otyrýar, sebäbi döredilen sözler bu maksadatly sözlerin tapawutlyklaryny we maksadatlaryny görkezmelidir. Maksady okuwçylara meňzeş fonlar we bilim derejesi bolup biler. Farklı fonlary we seçmenlerin derejesi üçin düşünebilir ýaly sözleri döretmek üçin wajyplyr. Bu meseleleri çözmek üçin, bu zady üçin kontrol edilebilir maksady-söz bilinç nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Biziň teklip eden nusgasymyz bolan maksady sözler üçin örnekler döredip biler. Şimdiye-de, biziň modelimiz ullanjak ukyplaryň ýagdaýynyň, uzunlygy we leksiýa çykyşlygyny, bu sebäpli maksadly seçmenler üçin gowy mysal getirýär. Oksforda sözlük maglumatynda awtomatik we adamlaryň deňlenmeleri biziň modelimiz isleýän okaylyşlyklary bilen maksadly sözler üçin örneklerimiz döredip biljekdigini görkez.', 'fa': 'جمله\u200cهای مثال برای کلمات هدف\u200cیافته در یک کلمات یک نقش مهم برای کمک به خوانندگان برای فهمیدن استفاده از کلمات است. به طور سنتی، جمله\u200cهای مثال در یک لغوی معمولاً توسط متخصص زبان\u200cشناسی ایجاد می\u200cشوند، که عمده\u200cی کار و علم-intensive هستند. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل تولید مثال جمله\u200cای را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، که هدف خودکار برای تولید کردن جمله\u200cهای مثال جمله\u200cای برای کلمات هدف\u200cشده بر اساس تعریف\u200cهای متفاوتی است. این وظیفه مخصوصا برای کلمات زیادی مشکل می\u200cکند، زیرا جمله\u200cهای تولید شده باید استفاده\u200cهای مختلف و معنی\u200cهای این کلمات هدف را تفسیر کنند. خواننده\u200cهای هدف ممکن است همچنین زمینه\u200cهای متفاوتی و سطح آموزشی داشته باشند. برای تولید کردن جمله\u200cهای مثال ضروری است که می\u200cتوانند برای زمینه\u200cهای مختلف و سطح حضار متفاوت درک کنند. برای حل این مشکلات، ما یک مدل کنترل قابل ذهن کلمات را برای این کار پیشنهاد می کنیم. مدل پیشنهاد ما می تواند مثالهای منطقی برای کلمات هدف، حتی برای کلمات زیادی تولید کند. علاوه بر این، مدل ما اجازه می دهد کاربران را کنترل مشخص بر ویژه\u200cهای رابطه به خواندگی، مثل طول و پیچیدگی زبان، به همین دلیل تولید نمونه\u200cهای مناسب برای بینندگان هدف می\u200cکنند. ارزیابی\u200cهای خودکار و انسان در مجموعه داده\u200cهای آکسفورد، نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما می\u200cتواند مثال مناسب برای کلمات هدف\u200cگیری با تعریف\u200cهای خاص در زمان ملاقات با خواندن قابلیت آرزوی را تولید کند.', 'sq': "Përpjekje fjalësh për fjalë të synuara në një fjalor luajnë një rol të rëndësishëm për të ndihmuar lexuesit të kuptojnë përdorimin e fjalëve. Tradicionalisht, fjalët shembullore në një fjalor zakonisht krijohen nga ekspertët gjuhësore, të cilët janë intensivë në punë dhe në njohuri. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim problemin e gjenerimit të shembujve të fjalëkalimit, duke synuar automatikisht të gjenerojmë shembuj të fjalëkalimit për fjalë të synuara sipas përkufizimeve korrespondente. Kjo detyrë është sfiduese veçanërisht për fjalët polisemore, sepse fjalët e gjeneruara duhet të pasqyrojnë përdorime dhe kuptime të ndryshme të këtyre fjalëve të synuara. Lexuesit e synuar mund të kenë gjithashtu baza të ndryshme dhe nivele arsimore. Është thelbësore të gjenerohen shembuj fjalësh që mund të jenë të kuptueshme për sfond të ndryshëm dhe nivele të publikut. Për t'i zgjidhur këto probleme, ne propozojmë një model të kontrollueshëm objektiv-fjalë-në-dijeni për këtë detyrë. Our proposed model can generate reasonable examples for targeted words, even for polysemous words.  Përveç kësaj, modeli ynë lejon përdoruesit të ofrojnë kontrollin eksplicit mbi atributet lidhur me lexueshmërinë, të tilla si gjatësia dhe kompleksiteti lexik, duke krijuar kështu shembuj të përshtatshëm për publikun e synuar. Vlerësimet automatike dhe njerëzore në kompletin e të dhënave të fjalorit të Oksfordit tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të gjenerojë shembuj të përshtatshëm për fjalët e synuara me përcaktimet specifike ndërsa përmbush lexueshmërinë e dëshiruar.", 'hy': 'Բառարանում նշանակված բառերի օրինակ նախադասությունները կարևոր դեր են խաղում, որպեսզի օգնեն կարդացողներին հասկանալ բառերի օգտագործումը: Հաճախ բառարանի օրինակ նախադասությունները սովորաբար ստեղծվում են լեզվաբանական մասնագետների կողմից, որոնք աշխատանքի ինտենսիվ և գիտելիքի ինտենսիվ են: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք բառարանի օրինակի նախադասությունների ստեղծման խնդիրը, որի նպատակն է ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծել բառարանի օրինակի նախադասություններ նպատակային բառերի համար, ըստ համապատասխան սահմանումների Այս խնդիրը հատկապես պոլիզեմային բառերի համար դժվար է, որովհետև ստեղծված նախադասությունները պետք է արտացոլում են այս նպատակային բառերի տարբեր օգտագործումները և իմաստները: Նպատակային ընթերցողները կարող են նաև ունենալ տարբեր հիմքեր և կրթական մակարդակներ: Կարևոր է ստեղծել օրինակ նախադասություններ, որոնք կարող են հասկանալ լսարանի տարբեր հիմքերի և մակարդակների համար: Այս խնդիրները լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք վերահսկելի նպատակային բառերի գիտակցության մոդել: Մեր առաջարկած մոդելը կարող է ստեղծել հասարակ օրինակներ նպատակավոր բառերի համար, նույնիսկ պոլիզեմային բառերի համար: Ավելին, մեր մոդելը թույլ է տալիս օգտագործողներին պարզ կառավարություն տալ կարդալիության հետ կապված առանձնահատկությունների վրա, ինչպիսիք են երկարությունը և լեքսիկական բարդությունը, որպեսզի հանդիսատեսների համար հարմար օրինակներ ստեղծեն Օքսֆորդի բառարանի տվյալների համակարգի ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է ստեղծել համապատասխան օրինակներ նպատակավոր բառերի համար, որոնք ունեն որոշակի սահմանումներ, միաժամանակ հատուկ լինելով ցան', 'af': "Voorbeeld setinge vir doelgemaakte woorde in 'n woordeboek speel 'n belangrik rol om lesers te help om die gebruik van woorde te verstaan. Tradisjoneel is voorbeeld setings in 'n woordeboek gewoonlik geskep deur lingwisiese eksperte wat arbeid-intensief en kennis-intensief is. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons die probleem van woordeboekvoorbeeld voorbeeld voorskrifte, met die doel van automaties om woordeboekvoorbeeld voorbeeld vir doelde woorde te genereer volgens die ooreenstemmende definisies. Hierdie taak is spesifieke aanvaardig vir polisemese woorde, omdat die genereerde setnings nodig om verskillende gebruike en betekenings van hierdie doelgemaakte woorde te reflekteer. Teëlde lesers dalk mag ook verskillende agtergrond en opvoedkundige vlakke hê. Dit is noodsaaklik om voorbeeld setinge te genereer wat verskillende agtergrond en vlakke van publiekers kan verstaan word. Om hierdie probleem te los, voorstel ons 'n beheerbare doel-woord-bewys model vir hierdie taak. Ons voorgestelde model kan redelike voorbeelde genereer vir doelgemaakte woorde, selfs vir polisemese woorde. In addition, our model allows users to provide explicit control over attributes related to readability, such as length and lexical complexity, thus generating suitable examples for targeted audiences. Outomatiese en menslike evaluasies op die Oxford woordeboek datastel vertoon dat ons model kan genereer geskikte voorbeelde vir doelgemaakte woorde met spesifieke definisies terwyl die verwagte leesbaarheid ontmoet word.", 'am': 'የመዝገበ ቃላት ለመጠበቅ ቃላት በመዝገበ ቋንቋ ውስጥ አንባቢዎች የቃላትን መጠቀም ለማስተዋል የሚረዳቸው የግል ሚዛን ያሳያል፡፡ በተባሕላዊው፣ የመግቢያ ቃላት በመዝገብ በቋንቋዎች አስተማሪዎች ይፈጠራሉ፣ እነዚህም የድካም እና እውቀት አዋቂዎች ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የመዝገበኛ ትውልድ ላይ የመዝገበኛ ምሳሌ ትውልድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ ስራ በተለየ የፖሊሲም ቃላት መቀላቀል ነው፤ ምክንያቱም የተፈጠሩት ቃላት የተለያዩ ጥያቄዎችን እና የእነዚህን የተቃውሞ ቃሎች እንዲመለሱ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የተጠቃሚ አንባቢዎች የመደብ መደብ እና ትምህርት ደረጃዎች ይኖራሉ፡፡ ለምሳሌ ቃላትን መፍጠር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ለልዩ የመደብ መሬት እና ለታዳቂዎች ደረጃዎች እንዲያስተውሉ ነው፡፡ እነዚህን መከራዎች ለመፍታት፣ ለዚህ ስራ የተቆጣጠውን የንግግር-የሚያውቅ ሞዴል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ለጥያቄ ቃላት፣ ለፖሊሳዊ ቃላት እንኳ ምሳሌዎችን ለማፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ሞዴላታችን በተቃዋሚዎች ላይ እንደርዝመት እና የሊክሲካዊ ግጭት በተደረገ አካባቢዎች ላይ ግልጽን ሥልጣን እንዲያደርጉ ይፈቅዳል፡፡ በOxford የመዝገበ ቃላት ዳራሲ ማሳየት በራስነት እና የሰው ውጤቶች የሚያሳየው ሞዴል በተፈቀደ አቃላት በተለያዩ እውቀት በተቃራኒ እውቀት በመገናኘት ጊዜ ለሚያስፈልጋቸው ምሳሌዎች እንዲያስተካክሉ ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'সংবাদপত্রে লক্ষ্য শব্দের জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পাঠকদের ব্যবহার বুঝতে সাহায্য করার উদাহরণ। সাধারণত ভাষাবিজ্ঞানী বিশেষজ্ঞদের সৃষ্টি করে একটি অভিধানের বাক্য, যেগুলো শ্রমিক বিশেষজ্ঞ এবং জ্ঞানের গভীর। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সংশ্লিষ্ট সংবাদ প্রজন্মের ক্ষেত্রে কনফিগারেশনের সমস্যা চিহ্নিত করি, যার উদ্দেশ্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে লক্ষ্যবস্তুর এই কাজ বিশেষ করে বহুবিধ শব্দের জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে, কারণ তৈরি করা হয়েছে বাক্যের বিভিন্ন ব্যবহার এবং লক্ষ্য করা শব্দের মা লক্ষ্য করা পাঠকদেরও বিভিন্ন পটভূমি ও শিক্ষা স্তর থাকতে পারে। উদাহরণের বাক্য তৈরি করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ যা বিভিন্ন পটভূমি এবং দর্শকদের স্তরে বুঝতে পারে। এই সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি নিয়ন্ত্রণিত লক্ষ্য-শব্দ-সচেতন মডেল প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল তৈরি করতে পারে লক্ষ্যবস্তুত শব্দের জন্য যুক্ত উদাহরণ, এমনকি বহুলিশ শব্দের জন্য এছাড়াও, আমাদের মডেল ব্যবহারকারীদের পাঠকতার সাথে সম্পর্কিত বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর সুস্পষ্ট নিয়ন্ত্রণ প্রদান করার অনুমতি দেয়, যেমন দী Automatic and human evaluations on the Oxford dictionary dataset show that our model can generate suitable examples for targeted words with specific definitions while meeting the desired readability.', 'ca': "Exemples de frases per paraules mirades en un diccionari juguen un paper important per ajudar als lectors a entendre l'ús de paraules. Tradicionalment, exemples de frases en un diccionari normalment es creen per experts lingüístics, que són intensivs en treball i en coneixement. En aquest article introduim el problema de la generació d'exemples de frases en diccionari, mirant a generar automàticament frases d'exemples en diccionari per paraules mirades segons les definicions correspondents. Aquesta tasca és especialment difícil per a paraules polisèmiques, perquè les frases generades han de reflexionar diferents ús i significats d'aquestes paraules mirades. Els lectors mirats també poden tenir diversos antecedents i nivells educatius. És essencial generar exemples de frases que poden ser comprensibles per diferents contextos i nivells d'audiència. Per resoldre aquests problemes, proposem un model controlable de consciència de paraules d'objectiu per a aquesta tasca. El nostre model proposat pot generar exemples raonables per paraules mirades, fins i tot per paraules polisèmiques. A més, el nostre model permet als usuaris proporcionar un control explícit sobre atributs relacionats amb la llegibilitat, com la llargada i la complexitat lexical, generant així exemples adequats per a l'audiència mirada. Les evaluacions automàtiques i humanes del conjunt de dades del diccionari d'Oxford mostren que el nostre model pot generar exemples adequats per paraules mirades amb definicions específiques mentre satisfet la llegibilitat desitjada.", 'az': 'Sözlükdə nişan edilmiş sözlər üçün misal sözlər oxuyanlara sözlərin istifadəsini anlamağa yardım etmək üçün vacib rol oynayır. Həmçin in, sözlükdə məsələlər çox dil müxtəlif təhsil sahibləri tarafından yaradılırlar. Onlar işi çox şiddətli və bilgi çox şiddətli. Bu kağızda, sözlük məsələlərinin məsələsini təşkil edirik, sözlük məsələlərini öz-özünə təşkil etmək məqsədilə müəyyən edilən sözlərin məsələlərini təşkil edirik. Bu iş çoxlu sözlər üçün çətinliklə çəkilir, çünki təşkil edilmiş cümlələr bu sözlərin müxtəlif istifadələrini və məsələlərini təşkil etməlidirlər. Məqsəd oxuyanlar də müxtəlif arxa tərəflər və təhsil səviyyələri ola bilər. Müxtəlif arxa tərəfində və səviyyələrində anlanabilir məsələlər yaratmaq məqsədildir. Bu problemləri çəkmək üçün, bu işin müdafiə edilə bilən hedef-söz-bilən modeli təklif edirik. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz müəyyən edilmiş sözlər üçün, hətta çoxlu sözlər üçün çoxlu misallar yarada bilər. Üstəlik, modellərimiz istifadəçilərə oxuyabilərək, uzunluğu və leksik kompleksitə bənzər təsirlər üzərində açıq-aydın kontrol verməyə imkan verir, beləliklə məqsədilə təsirlər üçün uyğun nümunələr yaradır. Oxfordsə sözlük verilənlərinin avtomatik və insan değerlendirmələri göstərir ki, modellərimiz istədiyi oxuyabilənlərlə müəyyən edilən sözlər üçün uyğun məsəllər yarada bilər.', 'bs': 'Primjer rečenica za ciljane riječi u rečniku igraju važnu ulogu za pomoć čitačima da razumiju korištenje riječi. Tradicionalno, primjerne rečenice u rečniku obično stvaraju lingvistički stručnjaci, koji su intenzivni i znanstveni. U ovom papiru predstavljamo problem generacije rečenica primjera rečenica, ciljanje automatski proizvesti primjerne rečenice za ciljane riječi u skladu s odgovarajućim definicijama. Ovaj zadatak je izazovan posebno za polisemske riječi, jer proizvedene rečenice moraju odražavati različite korištenja i smisla tih ciljnih riječi. Ciljni čitači također mogu imati različite pozadine i razine obrazovanja. Važno je proizvesti primjerne rečenice koje mogu razumjeti za različite pozadine i razine publike. Da bi riješili te probleme, predlažemo kontrolni model za ovaj zadatak. Naš predloženi model može stvoriti razumne primjere za ciljane riječi, čak i za polizemne riječi. Osim toga, naš model omogućava korisnicima da pruže ekskluzivnu kontrolu nad atributima povezanim s čitljivošću, poput dužine i leksičke kompleksnosti, tako stvarajući odgovarajuće primjere za ciljne publike. Automatske i ljudske procjene na setu podataka o Oxfordskom rečniku pokazuju da naš model može stvoriti odgovarajuće primjere za ciljane riječi sa specifičnim definicijama dok ispunjavamo željenu čitljivost.', 'cs': 'Příklady vět pro cílená slova ve slovníku hrají důležitou roli, která pomáhají čtenářům porozumět používání slov. Tradičně jsou příkladové věty ve slovníku obvykle vytvářeny lingvistickými experty, kteří jsou náročné na práci a náročné na znalosti. V tomto článku představujeme problém generování příkladových vět slovníku, jehož cílem je automaticky generovat příkladové věty slovníku pro cílená slova podle odpovídajících definicí. Tento úkol je náročný zejména pro polyemozní slova, protože generované věty musí odrážet různé použití a významy těchto cílových slov. Cílení čtenáři mohou mít také různé zázemí a úrovně vzdělání. Je nezbytné vytvořit příklady vět, které mohou být srozumitelné pro různé pozadí a úrovně publika. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme pro tento úkol kontrolovatelný model cílových slov. Náš navržený model může generovat rozumné příklady pro cílená slova, a to i pro polyemozní slova. Navíc náš model umožňuje uživatelům poskytnout explicitní kontrolu nad atributy souvisejícími s čitelností, jako je délka a lexikální složitost, čímž generuje vhodné příklady pro cílené publikum. Automatická a lidská hodnocení datové sady Oxfordského slovníku ukazují, že náš model dokáže generovat vhodné příklady pro cílená slova s konkrétními definicemi při splnění požadované čitelnosti.', 'et': 'Sõnastiku sihtsõnade näidislaused mängivad olulist rolli, et aidata lugejatel mõista sõnade kasutamist. Traditsiooniliselt loovad sõnastikus näidislaused tavaliselt keeleteaduse eksperdid, mis on töömahukad ja teadmistemahukad. Käesolevas töös tutvustame sõnastiku näidislausete genereerimise probleemi, mille eesmärk on automaatselt genereerida sõnastiku näidislauseid sihtsõnadele vastavalt vastavatele definitsioonidele. See ülesanne on keeruline eriti polüsemoossete sõnade puhul, sest loodud laused peavad peegeldama nende sihtsõnade erinevaid kasutusviise ja tähendusi. Sihtlugejatel võib olla ka erinev taust ja haridustase. Oluline on luua näidislauseid, mis võivad olla arusaadavad erinevatele taustadele ja vaatajaskondadele. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja kontrollitava sihtsõna-teadliku mudeli selle ülesande jaoks. Meie kavandatud mudel võib luua mõistlikke näiteid sihtsõnade, isegi polüsemoossete sõnade kohta. Lisaks võimaldab meie mudel kasutajatel selgesõnaliselt kontrollida loetavusega seotud atribuute, nagu pikkus ja leksikaalne keerukus, luues seega sobivaid näiteid sihtrühmadele. Oxfordi sõnastiku andmekogumi automaatsed ja inimlikud hindamised näitavad, et meie mudel suudab luua sobivaid näiteid sihtsõnade jaoks konkreetsete definitsioonidega, saavutades samas soovitud loetavuse.', 'fi': 'Esimerkkilauseet kohdennetuille sanoille sanakirjassa ovat tärkeitä, jotta lukijat ymmärtävät sanojen käyttöä. Perinteisesti sanakirjan esimerkkilauseet luovat yleensä kielitieteen asiantuntijat, jotka ovat työvoimavaltaisia ja tietovaltaisia. Tässä työssä esitellään sanakirjan esimerkkilauseiden tuottamisen ongelma, jonka tavoitteena on luoda automaattisesti sanakirjan esimerkkilauseita kohdesanoille vastaavien määritelmien mukaisesti. Tämä tehtävä on haastava erityisesti moniäänisille sanoille, koska luotujen lauseiden tulee heijastaa näiden kohdesanojen erilaisia käyttötapoja ja merkityksiä. Kohdennetuilla lukijoilla voi olla myös erilaiset taustat ja koulutustaso. On tärkeää luoda esimerkkilauseita, jotka ovat ymmärrettäviä eri taustoille ja yleisötasoille. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme kontrolloitavaa kohdesanatietoista mallia tähän tehtävään. Ehdotettu malli voi tuottaa järkeviä esimerkkejä kohdesanoista, jopa moniäänisistä sanoista. Lisäksi mallimme avulla käyttäjät voivat antaa selkeän hallinnan luettavuuteen liittyviin ominaisuuksiin, kuten pituuteen ja sanastoon liittyvään monimutkaisuuteen, luoden näin sopivia esimerkkejä kohdeyleisöille. Automaattiset ja inhimilliset arvioinnit Oxfordin sanakirjasta osoittavat, että mallimme voi tuottaa sopivia esimerkkejä kohdennetuille sanoille, joilla on tietyt määritelmät, ja samalla saavuttaa halutun luettavuuden.', 'sk': 'Primeri stavkov za ciljne besede v slovarju igrajo pomembno vlogo pri razumevanju uporabe besed bralcem. Tradicionalno primerne stavke v slovarju običajno ustvarjajo jezikoslovni strokovnjaki, ki so delovno intenzivni in znanje intenzivni. V prispevku predstavljamo problem ustvarjanja slovarskih primerov stavkov, katerega cilj je samodejno ustvarjanje slovarskih primerov stavkov za ciljne besede v skladu z ustreznimi definicijami. Ta naloga je izziv zlasti za poličemske besede, saj morajo ustvarjeni stavki odražati različne uporabe in pomene teh ciljnih besed. Ciljni bralci imajo lahko tudi različno ozadje in stopnjo izobrazbe. Bistveno je ustvariti zgledne stavke, ki so lahko razumljivi za različna ozadja in ravni občinstva. Za reševanje teh problemov predlagamo nadzorovljiv model ozaveščanja o ciljnih besedah za to nalogo. Naš predlagani model lahko ustvari razumne primere za ciljne besede, tudi za poličemske besede. Poleg tega naš model uporabnikom omogoča, da zagotovijo ekspliciten nadzor nad atributi, povezanimi z berljivostjo, kot sta dolžina in leksikalna kompleksnost, s čimer ustvarijo primerne primere za ciljne skupine. Avtomatske in človeške ocene na naboru podatkov Oxford slovarja kažejo, da lahko naš model ustvari primerne primere za ciljne besede s specifičnimi definicijami, hkrati pa dosega želeno berljivost.', 'ha': "Misali maganar da aka yi wa maganar da aka yi amfani da shi cikin wata dictionary, za'a yi amfani da amfani da maganar. Kitraditionn, misali, misãlai masu cikin wata dictionary ana halitta su ɗabi'a daga masu ma'anar harshen, da masu kamfata da masu cikin aikin mai kiyaya da saniya. Daga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wa masu zartar da misãlin cewa dictionary, don ya yi amfani da yin zartar da shi farat-ɗabi'a zuwa misãlai na dictionary wa maganar da aka yi amfani da kuma da tsarin da ke daidaita. Wannan aikin yana tsõratar da haske wa kalmõmi masu yiwuwa na musamman, dõmin a buƙata maganar da aka ƙãga, su yi riƙo ga amfani da amfani da fassarar maganar waɗannan da aka yi amfani da. Akwai karatun da aka yi amfani da shi yana da zane daban-daban da aka sani. It is essential to generate example sentences that can be understandable for different backgrounds and levels of audiences.  Ga mu raba wa masu yiwuwa, za mu buƙata wani misali wanda ke iya lissafa wa maganar-word-mai sanarwa wa wannan aikin. Misalinmu da aka buƙata, yana iya ƙiƙiro misãlai masu inganci wa maganar da aka yi amfani da shi, kuma kõ dã wa kalmõmi masu ƙaranci. Da wannan, misalinmu yana yarda masu amfani da shi ga su bãyar da Control mai bayyani a kan misãlai masu hususann karatun da matsayin karatun, kamar tsawo da muhimmanci na leksisi, don haka ya ƙãga misãlai masu daidai wa saurãre da aka yi amfani da shi. Ana iya ƙayyade farat ɗaya da mutum kan tsarin tsarin dictionary Oxfield na nuna cewa misalinmu na iya ƙiƙiro misãlai masu daidai wa maganar da aka yi amfani da shi masu basu'a da tsari masu ƙayyade idan an haɗa abincin da ake son karantawa.", 'he': 'משפטים דוגמאים למילים ממוקדות במילון משחקים תפקיד חשוב כדי לעזור לקוראים להבין את השימוש במילים. בדרך מסורתית, משפטים דוגמאים במילון נוצרים בדרך כלל על ידי מומחים לשוניות, שהם אינטנסיביים לעבודה וידעים אינטנסיביים. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים את הבעיה של דוגמא מילון יוצר משפטים, המתכוון ליצור אוטומטית משפטים דוגמא מילון למילים ממוקדות לפי ההגדרות המתאימות. המשימה הזאת מאתגרת במיוחד למילים פוליזמיות, כי המשפטים הנוצרים צריכים לשקף שימושים ומשומעות שונות של המילים המטרות האלה. לקוראים המטרה עשויים להיות גם רקעים שונים ורמות חינוכיות. זה חיוני ליצור דוגמאות משפטים שאפשר להבין עבור רקמות ורמות שונות של קהל. כדי לפתור את הבעיות האלה, אנו מציעים מודל מודע למילים-מטרה לשליטה למשימה הזאת. המודל המוצע שלנו יכול ליצור דוגמאות סבירות למילים ממוקדות, אפילו למילים פוליזמיות. בנוסף, המודל שלנו מאפשר למשתמשים לספק שליטה ברורה על תכונות שקשורות לקריאות, כמו אורך ומרכיבות לקסיקה, כך יוצרים דוגמאות מתאימות לקהל המטרה. Automatic and human evaluations on the Oxford dictionary dataset show that our model can generate suitable examples for targeted words with specific definitions while meeting the desired readability.', 'jv': 'Ballot xx Awak dhéwé, gerarané kapan kanggo diketeksi sing koyaké ning awak dhéwé kuwi mau, sing paling nggunaké karo awak-awak sing ngerasakno. Nang mapun iki, kéné gunakake perusahaan kanggo kelalaman urip, sanes nggawe automatik bukalaman kanggo kelalaman pawaran tarjamahan kanggo diketeksi sing beraksi Opong-task iki dadi nggambar luwih apik kanggo kelas polisemus, mergane awak dhéwé buturan kanggo ngerasah gambar lan bali-bisa kuwi nggawe kelas kuwi tarjamahan. Siji-Siji sing kelas akeh iso ngubah akeh podho karo layang-layang. Ere wajane kanggo ngelangubah juara sing bisa gabunggabi iki bangsane kapan mulasar lan kelas sing rawuh akeh Publik. Ditawak dhéwé ngéwangi perkoro iki, kita supoyo model sing wis nguasar Tarih-word-Awas kanggo nggawe mung iki dadi. model politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Automatik karo dolanan sing mengko karo dataset nang dikondari Oksfèrd mengko iso nggawe model sing bisa ngembut supaya karo cilihan kelangan sing apik dhéwé, nganggep dino sing nyimpen karo kelangan kelangan sing apik dhéwé.', 'bo': 'dictionary་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་འབེབས་ཡུལ་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་སྟོན་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན། གསལ་བརྗོད་ཅིག་ནང་གི་མིང་ཚིག་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ངལ་ཅན་གྱི་ནུས་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བ་དང་། འདི་ནི་སྐྱེས་ང ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚིག་གི་དཔེར་ན་ཚིག བྱ་ཚིག་འདི་ལ་ཆུང་ལ་དམིགས་འབེབས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གེ་ཚོར་མཚུངས་པ་ཡིན། གང་ལེགས་ཞེ་ན། ཁོང་གི་ཚིག་རྗེས་སུ་ཚོད་བྱས་པའ དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཡོད་པའི་ཀློག་འཇུག་པ་ཚོས་ཀྱང་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་དང་ཤེས་ཡོན་ཚད་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཡོད། རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་སོ་སོའི་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་དང་སྒྲ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་མི་འདྲ་བའི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཚོས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ཚོར་མོས་མཐུན་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མིག་དཔེ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་དམིགས་འབེབས་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྐོར་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀློག་འཇུག་སྟངས་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས Oxford ཡི་གེའི་འཇུག་ཟམ་ཐོག་གི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མིང་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་མིང་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དང་མ'}
{'en': 'Learned Incremental Representations for Parsing', 'ar': 'AraT5: محولات تحويل النص إلى نص لتوليد اللغة العربية', 'pt': 'AraT5: Transformadores de texto para texto para geração de idioma árabe', 'fr': 'AraT5\xa0: Transformateurs texte-texte pour la génération de la langue arabe', 'es': 'ARaT5: Transformadores de texto a texto para la generación de la lengua árabe', 'ja': 'AraT 5:アラビア語生成のためのテキストツーテキスト変換', 'zh': 'AraT5:阿拉伯语文本转换器', 'hi': 'AraT5: अरबी भाषा जनरेशन के लिए पाठ-से-पाठ ट्रांसफॉर्मर', 'ru': 'AraT5: Текстовые трансформаторы для создания арабского языка', 'ga': 'AraT5: Claochladáin Téacs-go-Téacs do Ghiniúint Teanga Araibis', 'ka': 'AraT5: ტექსტიდან ტექსტის ტრანფორმაციები არაბური ენის შექმნა', 'el': 'Μεταμορφωτές κειμένου σε κείμενο για την παραγωγή αραβικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'AraT5: Szöveg-szöveg transzformátorok az arab nyelv generálásához', 'it': 'AraT5: Trasformatori da testo a testo per la generazione della lingua araba', 'kk': 'AraT5: Араб тілді құру үшін мәтіннен мәтіннен түрлендірушілері', 'lt': 'AraT5: teksto į teksto transformatoriai arabų kalbų gamybai', 'mk': 'AraT5: Текст- во- текст трансформирачи за генерација арапски јазик', 'ms': 'AraT5: Penukar Teks- ke- Teks untuk Jenerasi Bahasa Arab', 'mt': 'AraT5: Text-to-Text Transformers for Arabic Language Generation', 'ml': 'അരാട്ടി5: പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dഫര്\u200dമാര്\u200d', 'mn': 'AraT5: Араб хэл төрөлхтний текст болон текст шилжүүлэгчид', 'no': 'AraT5: Tekst- til- teksttransformerer for arabisk språk- generering', 'pl': 'AraT5: Transformatory tekstu do tekstu dla generowania języka arabskiego', 'ro': 'AraT5: Transformatoare text-în-text pentru generarea limbii arabe', 'sr': 'AraT5: Transformeri teksta na tekst za generaciju arapskog jezika', 'so': 'AraT5: Text-to-Text Transformers for Arabic generation', 'sv': 'AraT5: Text-till-text transformatorer för arabiska språkgenerering', 'si': 'AraT5: අරාබි භාෂාව සිද්ධානය සඳහා පාළුවෙන් පාළුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය', 'ta': 'AraT5: உரையில் இருந்து உரை மாற்றுபவர்கள் அரபி மொழி உருவாக்கத்திற்காக', 'ur': 'عربی زبان پیدائش کے لئے متن سے متن تغییر کرنے والے', 'uz': 'AraT5: Matn- to- matn tarjima qiluvchilari arab tili yaratish uchun', 'vi': 'AraT5: Biến hình văn bản cho tạo ngôn ngữ Ả Rập', 'bg': 'AraT5: Трансформатори текст в текст за генериране на арабски език', 'nl': 'AraT5: Tekst-naar-Tekst Transformers voor Arabische Taalgeneratie', 'da': 'AraT5: Tekst-til-tekst transformatorer til arabisk sprog generation', 'hr': 'AraT5: Transformeri teksta na tekst za generaciju arapskog jezika', 'de': 'AraT5: Text-zu-Text Transformatoren für die Generierung arabischer Sprache', 'ko': 'AraT5: 아랍어로 생성된 텍스트-텍스트 변환기', 'id': 'AraT5: Transformer Teks-ke-Teks untuk Generasi Bahasa Arab', 'fa': 'AraT5: تغییردهندگان متن به متن برای نسل زبان عربی', 'tr': 'AraT5: Arapça dil döredişi üçin metin-tä-metin terjimeleri', 'sw': 'AraT5: Transformers to Text-to-Text for Generation of Language', 'sq': 'AraT5: Transformuesit Tekst-Tekst për Gjenerimin e Gjuhave Arabe', 'af': 'AraT5: Teks- na- teks Transformeerders vir Arabiese Taal Generasie', 'hy': 'Արաբական լեզուների ստեղծման տեքստի-տեքստի փոխարինողներ', 'am': 'AraT5: Text-to-Text Transformers for Arabic language Generation', 'az': 'AraT5: Arap칞a dil n톛z톛riyy톛ti 칲칞칲n metin-t톛-metin transformat칞캼lar캼', 'bn': 'AraT5: আরবী ভাষা প্রজন্মের জন্য টেক্সট- থেকে টেক্সট ট্রান্সফর্মার', 'ca': 'AraT5: Transformers de text a text per a la generació de llenguatges àrabs', 'bs': 'AraT5: Transformeri teksta na tekst za generaciju arapskog jezika', 'cs': 'AraT5: Transformátory textu na text pro generování arabského jazyka', 'et': 'AraT5: tekstist tekstiks muundajad araabia keele genereerimiseks', 'fi': 'AraT5: Teksti tekstiksi muuntajat arabian kielen luomiseen', 'jv': 'araT 5: Ngubah Teks-Teks Transformer kanggo Kemerdekaan Jaringan Tipe', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'AraT5: Pretvorniki besedila v besedilo za ustvarjanje arabskega jezika', 'bo': 'AraT5: Text-to-Text Transformers for Arabic Language Generation', 'he': 'AraT5: Text-to-Text Transformers for Arabic Language Generation'}
{'en': 'We present an incremental syntactic representation that consists of assigning a single discrete label to each word in a sentence where the label is predicted using strictly incremental processing of a prefix of the sentence and the sequence of labels for a sentence fully determines a parse tree Our goal is to induce a syntactic representation that commits to syntactic choices only as they are incrementally revealed by the input in contrast with standard representations that must make output choices such as attachments speculatively and later throw out conflicting analyses Our learned representations achieve 93.72 F1 on the Penn Treebank with as few as bits per word and at bits per word they achieve 94.97 F1 which is comparable with other state of the art parsing models when using the same pre trained embeddings We also provide an analysis of the representations learned by our system investigating properties such as the interpretable syntactic features captured by the system and mechanisms for deferred resolution of syntactic ambiguities', 'ar': 'تم اقتراح نقل التعلم باستخدام إطار عمل Transformer موحد (T5) يحول جميع مشاكل اللغة إلى تنسيق نص إلى نص كنهج تعليمي بسيط وفعال. على الرغم من تقديم نسخة متعددة اللغات من نموذج T5 (mT5) ، إلا أنه ليس من الواضح مدى نجاحه في المهام غير الإنجليزية التي تتضمن بيانات متنوعة. للتحقيق في هذا السؤال ، نطبق mT5 على لغة ذات لهجات متنوعة - العربية. للتقييم ، نقدم معيارًا جديدًا لتوليد اللغة العربية (ARGEN) ، يغطي سبع مهام مهمة. لمقارنة النماذج ، نقوم مسبقًا بتدريب ثلاثة نماذج عربية قوية على غرار T5 وتقييمها على ARGEN. على الرغم من تدريبها مسبقًا باستخدام 49 بيانات أقل ، إلا أن نماذجنا الجديدة تؤدي أداءً أفضل بكثير من mT5 في جميع مهام ARGEN (في 52 مجموعة اختبار من أصل 59) وتعيين العديد من SOTAs. تؤسس نماذجنا أيضًا SOTA الجديدة على معيار تقييم فهم اللغة العربية ARLUE المقترح مؤخرًا (عبد المجيد وآخرون ، 2021). نماذجنا الجديدة متاحة للجمهور. نحن أيضًا نرتبط بمجموعات بيانات ARGEN من خلال مستودعنا: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage par transfert avec un framework Transformer unifié (T5) qui convertit tous les problèmes de langage en un format texte-texte a récemment été proposé comme approche d'apprentissage par transfert simple et efficace. Bien qu'une version multilingue du modèle T5 (mT5) ait également été introduite, on ne sait pas exactement dans quelle mesure il peut s'acquitter de tâches non anglaises impliquant diverses données. Pour étudier cette question, nous appliquons MT5 à une langue avec une grande variété de dialectes\xa0: l'arabe. Pour l'évaluation, nous introduisons un nouveau point de référence pour la génération de la langue arabe (ARGEN), couvrant sept tâches importantes. Pour la comparaison des modèles, nous préformons trois puissants modèles arabes de style T5 et les évaluons sur ARGEN. Bien que pré-entraînés avec environ 49 données en moins, nos nouveaux modèles fonctionnent nettement mieux que mT5 sur toutes les tâches ARGEN (dans 52 ensembles de tests sur 59) et définissent plusieurs nouveaux SOTA. Nos modèles établissent également un nouveau SOTA sur le grand référentiel d'évaluation de la compréhension de la langue arabe récemment proposé ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Nos nouveaux modèles sont accessibles au public. Nous établissons également des liens vers des ensembles de données ARGEN via notre référentiel\xa0: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'pt': 'A transferência de aprendizagem com uma estrutura unificada Transformer (T5) que converte todos os problemas de linguagem em um formato de texto para texto foi proposta recentemente como uma abordagem de transferência de aprendizagem simples e eficaz. Embora uma versão multilíngue do modelo T5 (mT5) também tenha sido introduzida, não está claro o quão bem ele pode se sair em tarefas não inglesas envolvendo dados diversos. Para investigar essa questão, aplicamos o mT5 em um idioma com uma grande variedade de dialetos - o árabe. Para avaliação, apresentamos um novo benchmark para ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN), abrangendo sete tarefas importantes. Para comparação de modelos, pré-treinamos três poderosos modelos árabes no estilo T5 e os avaliamos no ARGEN. Embora pré-treinados com ~49 dados a menos, nossos novos modelos têm um desempenho significativamente melhor que o mT5 em todas as tarefas ARGEN (em 52 dos 59 conjuntos de teste) e definem vários novos SOTAs. Nossos modelos também estabelecem um novo SOTA no ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Nossos novos modelos estão disponíveis publicamente. Também vinculamos conjuntos de dados ARGEN por meio de nosso repositório: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'es': 'La transferencia del aprendizaje con un marco Transformer unificado (T5) que convierte todos los problemas del idioma en un formato de texto a texto se propuso recientemente como un enfoque de aprendizaje por transferencia simple y eficaz. Aunque también se introdujo una versión multilingüe del modelo T5 (mT5), no está claro qué tan bien puede desempeñarse en tareas que no estén en inglés y que impliquen datos diversos. Para investigar esta cuestión, aplicamos mT5 en un idioma con una amplia variedad de dialectos: el árabe. Para la evaluación, presentamos un nuevo punto de referencia para la Generación de Lenguaje Árabe (ARGEN), que cubre siete tareas importantes. Para comparar modelos, entrenamos previamente tres potentes modelos árabes de estilo T5 y los evaluamos en ARGEN. Aunque preentrenados con aproximadamente 49 datos menos, nuestros nuevos modelos funcionan significativamente mejor que mT5 en todas las tareas de ARGEN (en 52 de los 59 conjuntos de pruebas) y establecen varios SOTA nuevos. Nuestros modelos también establecen un nuevo SOTA en el referente de evaluación de la comprensión del idioma árabe ARLUE, propuesto recientemente (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Nuestros nuevos modelos están a disposición del público. También enlazamos a los conjuntos de datos de ARGEN a través de nuestro repositorio: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'zh': '近建一Transformer框架(T5)迁学,当框架转诸语言为文本格式,简而有效者也。 虽引入T5(mT5)多言版本,未详其非英语事也。 以此论之,当mT5多方言 - 阿拉伯语。 为料ARabic言GENeration(ARGEN),涵盖七务。 先练三强之阿拉伯语T5,以ARGEN质之。 虽预训之数减49约,而新模在诸ARGEN(59试集之52)显优于mT5,而设数新之SOTA。 又于近世大形阿拉伯语解估准ARLUE立新SOTA(Abdul-Mageed等,2021)。 新型号已明上市。 又因存储库链接至 ARGEN 数集:https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5。', 'ja': 'すべての言語の問題をテキスト間フォーマットに変換する統一されたトランスフォーマーフレームワーク（ T 5 ）を使用した転送学習は、単純で効果的な転送学習アプローチとして最近提案されました。 T 5モデル（ mT 5 ）の多言語版も導入されたが、多様なデータを伴う英語以外のタスクにどの程度対応できるかは不明である。 この質問を調査するために、私たちは多様な方言（アラビア語）を持つ言語にmT 5を適用します。 評価のために、7つの重要なタスクをカバーするARabic language GENeration （ ARGEN ）の新規ベンチマークを導入します。 モデル比較のために、3つの強力なアラビア語T 5スタイルモデルを事前にトレーニングし、Argenで評価します。 約49のデータを使用して事前にトレーニングを行いましたが、当社の新しいモデルは、すべてのArgenタスク（ 59のテストセットの52で）でmT 5よりも大幅に優れたパフォーマンスを発揮し、いくつかの新しいSOTAをセットしました。 私たちのモデルはまた、最近提案された大規模なアラビア語理解評価ベンチマークARLUEに新しいSOTAを確立します（ Abdul - Mageed et al., 2021 ）。 私たちの新しいモデルは一般に公開されています。 また、リポジトリ（ https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5 ）を通じてArgenデータセットにリンクしています。', 'hi': 'एक एकीकृत ट्रांसफॉर्मर फ्रेमवर्क (टी 5) के साथ स्थानांतरण सीखने का प्रस्ताव जो सभी भाषा समस्याओं को टेक्स्ट-टू-टेक्स्ट प्रारूप में परिवर्तित करता है, हाल ही में एक सरल और प्रभावी हस्तांतरण सीखने के दृष्टिकोण के रूप में प्रस्तावित किया गया था। हालांकि टी 5 मॉडल (एमटी 5) का एक बहुभाषी संस्करण भी पेश किया गया था, लेकिन यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि यह विभिन्न डेटा से जुड़े गैर-अंग्रेजी कार्यों पर कितनी अच्छी तरह से किराया कर सकता है। इस प्रश्न की जांच करने के लिए, हम विभिन्न प्रकार की बोलियों वाली भाषा पर mT5 लागू करते हैं - अरबी। मूल्यांकन के लिए, हम ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN) के लिए एक उपन्यास बेंचमार्क पेश करते हैं, जिसमें सात महत्वपूर्ण कार्य शामिल हैं। मॉडल तुलना के लिए, हम तीन शक्तिशाली अरबी T5-शैली मॉडल को पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और ARGEN पर उनका मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हालांकि ~ 49 कम डेटा के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित, हमारे नए मॉडल सभी ARGEN कार्यों (59 परीक्षण सेटों में से 52 में) पर mT5 की तुलना में काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं और कई नए SOTAs सेट करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल हाल ही में प्रस्तावित, बड़े अरबी भाषा को समझने वाले मूल्यांकन बेंचमार्क ARLUE (अब्दुल-मगेड एट अल। हमारे नए मॉडल सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध हैं। हम अपने भंडार के माध्यम से ARGEN डेटासेट से भी लिंक करते हैं: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5।', 'ru': 'В качестве простого и эффективного подхода к обучению трансферу недавно было предложено трансферное обучение с использованием унифицированной трансформерной структуры (T5), которая преобразует все языковые проблемы в текстовый формат. Хотя была также введена многоязычная версия модели Т5 (mT5), неясно, насколько хорошо она может справляться с неанглоязычными задачами, связанными с различными данными. Чтобы исследовать этот вопрос, мы применяем mT5 на языке с широким разнообразием диалектов - арабском. Для оценки мы вводим новый эталон для генераций на арабическом языке (ARGEN), охватывающий семь важных задач. Для сравнения моделей мы предварительно обучаем три мощные арабские модели в стиле T5 и оцениваем их на ARGEN. Хотя наши новые модели предварительно обучены с ~49 меньшим количеством данных, они работают значительно лучше, чем mT5, на всех задачах ARGEN (в 52 из 59 тестовых наборов) и устанавливают несколько новых SOTA. Наши модели также устанавливают новую SOTA на недавно предложенном, крупном эталоне оценки понимания арабского языка ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Наши новые модели находятся в открытом доступе. Мы также связываемся с наборами данных ARGEN через наш репозиторий: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ga': 'Moladh le déanaí foghlaim aistrithe le creat Trasfhoirmeoir aontaithe (T5) a athraíonn gach fadhb teanga go formáid téacs-go-téacs mar chur chuige foghlama aistrithe simplí agus éifeachtach. Cé gur tugadh isteach leagan ilteangach den tsamhail T5 (mT5) freisin, níl sé soiléir cé chomh maith agus is féidir leis dul i bhfeidhm ar thascanna neamh-Bhéarla a bhaineann le sonraí éagsúla. Chun an cheist seo a fhiosrú, cuirimid mT5 i bhfeidhm ar theanga le raon leathan canúintí -- Araibis. Le haghaidh meastóireachta, tugaimid isteach tagarmharc nua le haghaidh Giniúint na dTeangacha Arabacha (ARGEN), a chlúdaíonn seacht dtasc thábhachtacha. Chun comparáid a dhéanamh idir samhlacha, déanaimid réamhthraenáil ar thrí mhúnla chumhachtacha Araibis T5 agus déanaimid measúnú orthu ar ARGEN. Cé gur réamhoiliúint iad le ~49 níos lú sonraí, feidhmíonn ár múnlaí nua i bhfad níos fearr ná mT5 ar gach tasc ARGEN (i 52 as 59 tacair tástála) agus socraíonn siad roinnt SOTA nua. Bunaíonn ár samhlacha SOTA nua freisin ar thagarmharc mór meastóireachta ar thuiscint na teanga Araibise a moladh le déanaí, ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Tá ár múnlaí nua ar fáil go poiblí. Déanaimid nasc freisin le tacair shonraí ARGEN trínár stór: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ka': 'ტრანფორმეტრის გასწავლება ერთადერთი ტრანფორმეტრის ფრამეტრი (T5) რომელიც ყველა ენერგიის პრობლემების ტექსტის ტექსტის ფორმეტში გადაცვლა ახლა მოძლევა როგორც უკ თუმცა T5 მოდელის მრავალენგური ვერსია (mT5) იყენებულია, მაგრამ არ არის წარმოიდგინე, რამდენი კარგი შეუძლია ინგლისური დავალების შესახებ განსხვავებული მონაცემები. ამ კითხვის შესახებ, ჩვენ mT5-ს ენაზე გამოყენებთ განსხვავებული დიალეკტები - არაბული. განსაზღვრებისთვის, ჩვენ აპრაბიკური ენერაციის (ARGEN) პრომენტის ბენქმარკის გადავიტანოთ, რომელიც შვიდი მნიშვნელოვანი დავალება. მოდელის შემდგომარებისთვის, ჩვენ სამი ძალიან არაბული T5 სტილის მოდელის გავაგრძნოთ და დავუმუშაოთ ARGEN-ზე. თუმცა ~49 ცოტა მონაცემებით უფრო მუშაობელია, ჩვენი ახალი მოდელები უფრო მუშაობელია mT5-ზე ყველა ARGEN მოქმედებით (52 წლის 59 ტესტის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწილის ნაწი ჩვენი მოდელები ასევე ახალი SOTA-ს დააყენება ახალგაზრდებული, დიდი აპაბური ენის განსხვავების ბენქმარი ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). ჩვენი ახალი მოდელები ადამიანებით ხელხილებიან. ჩვენ ასევე ARGEN მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას ჩვენი რეპოზიტორიით დაკავშირებთ: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'el': 'Η μεταφορά μάθησης με ένα ενοποιημένο πλαίσιο που μετατρέπει όλα τα γλωσσικά προβλήματα σε μορφή κειμένου προτάθηκε πρόσφατα ως μια απλή και αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση μάθησης μεταφοράς. Μολονότι εισήχθη επίσης μια πολύγλωσση έκδοση του μοντέλου T5 (mT5), δεν είναι σαφές πόσο καλά μπορεί να τα καταφέρει σε μη αγγλικές εργασίες που περιλαμβάνουν ποικίλα δεδομένα. Για να διερευνήσουμε αυτό το ερώτημα, εφαρμόζουμε το mT5 σε μια γλώσσα με μεγάλη ποικιλία διαλέκτων – αραβικά. Για αξιολόγηση, εισάγουμε ένα νέο κριτήριο αναφοράς για τη ΓΕΝΕΙΑ ΑΡαβικής γλώσσας (ΑΡΓΕΝ), που καλύπτει επτά σημαντικά καθήκοντα. Για σύγκριση μοντέλων, προετοιμάζουμε τρία ισχυρά αραβικά μοντέλα τύπου και τα αξιολογούμε στο ΑΡΓΕΝ. Αν και προ-εκπαιδευμένα με ~49 λιγότερα δεδομένα, τα νέα μοντέλα μας αποδίδουν σημαντικά καλύτερα από το σε όλες τις εργασίες και θέτουν αρκετές νέες SOTAs. Τα μοντέλα μας καθιερώνουν επίσης νέα SOTA στο πρόσφατα προτεινόμενο, μεγάλο κριτήριο αξιολόγησης κατανόησης αραβικής γλώσσας ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Τα νέα μας μοντέλα είναι δημόσια διαθέσιμα. Συνδέουμε επίσης με σύνολα δεδομένων μέσω του αποθετηρίου μας: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'hu': 'A transzfer tanulás egy egységes Transformer keretrendszerrel (T5), amely az összes nyelvi problémát szöveges-szöveges formátumba alakítja át a közelmúltban egy egyszerű és hatékony transzfer tanulási megközelítésként javasolták. Bár a T5 modell (mT5) többnyelvű változatát is bevezették, nem egyértelmű, hogy milyen jól tud teljesíteni a különböző adatokat tartalmazó, nem angol nyelvű feladatokban. Ennek a kérdésnek a vizsgálatához az mT5-öt alkalmazzuk a nyelvjárások széles választékával - arabul. Az értékeléshez egy új referenciaértéket vezetünk be az ARabic nyelv generációjára (ARGEN), amely hét fontos feladatot fed fel. A modellek összehasonlításához három erőteljes arab T5 stílusú modellt készítünk elő, és értékeljük őket ARGEN-en. Bár az előkészített, 49-nél kevesebb adattal rendelkeznek, az új modelleink minden ARGEN feladatnál jelentősen jobb teljesítményt nyújtanak (59 tesztkészletből 52-ben), és számos új SOTA-t állítanak be. Modelljeink új SOTA-t hoznak létre a közelmúltban javasolt, nagy arab nyelvértési értékelési referenciaértéken ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Az új modelleink nyilvánosan elérhetők. Az ARGEN adatkészletekhez is kapcsolódunk adattárunkon keresztül: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'it': "L'apprendimento di trasferimento con un framework unificato Transformer (T5) che converte tutti i problemi linguistici in un formato testo-testo è stato recentemente proposto come un approccio semplice ed efficace di apprendimento di trasferimento. Sebbene sia stata introdotta anche una versione multilingue del modello T5 (mT5), non è chiaro quanto possa fare per attività non inglesi che coinvolgono dati diversi. Per indagare su questa domanda, applichiamo mT5 su una lingua con un'ampia varietà di dialetti - l'arabo. Per la valutazione, introduciamo un nuovo benchmark per la GENERAZIONE ARabica del linguaggio (ARGEN), coprendo sette compiti importanti. Per il confronto dei modelli, pre-addestriamo tre potenti modelli in stile T5 arabo e li valutiamo su ARGEN. Anche se pre-addestrati con circa 49 dati in meno, i nostri nuovi modelli funzionano significativamente meglio di mT5 su tutte le attività ARGEN (in 52 su 59 set di test) e impostano diversi nuovi SOTA. I nostri modelli stabiliscono anche un nuovo SOTA sul benchmark di valutazione della comprensione della lingua araba ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021) recentemente proposto. I nostri nuovi modelli sono disponibili al pubblico. Ci colleghiamo anche ai dataset ARGEN attraverso il nostro repository: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'lt': 'Neseniai buvo pasiūlytas perkėlimo mokymasis pagal vieningą perkėlimo sistemą (T5), kuri visų kalbų problemų paverčia teksto formatu, kaip paprastas ir veiksmingas perkėlimo mokymasis. Nors buvo pateikta ir daugiakalbė T5 modelio (mT5) versija, neaišku, kaip gerai jis gali atlikti ne anglų kalbos užduotis, apimančias įvairius duomenis. To investigate this question, we apply mT5 on a language with a wide variety of dialects--Arabic.  Vertinant, įvedame naują ARAB kalbos generacijos (ARGEN) lyginamąjį tašką, apimantį septynias svarbias užduotis. Norėdami palyginti modelius, parengiame tris galingus arabų T5 stilius modelius ir juos vertiname ARGEN. Nors iš anksto apmokyti apie 49 mažiau duomenų, mūsų nauji modeliai atlieka gerokai geresnius rezultatus nei mT5 visose ARGEN užduotyse (52 iš 59 bandymų rinkinių) ir nustato keletą naujų SOTA. Mūsų modeliai taip pat nustato naują SOTA dėl neseniai pasiūlyto didelio arabų kalbos supratimo vertinimo lyginamojo rodiklio ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Mūsų nauji modeliai yra viešai prieinami. Taip pat susiejame su ARGEN duomenų rinkiniais per savo saugyklą: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'kk': 'Барлық тіл мәселелерін мәтін- мен мәтін пішіміне аударатын біріктірілген транформациялау фреймімен (T5) оқыту үшін жуырдағы кәдімгі және эффективні оқыту тәсі Т5 моделінің көптілік нұсқасы (mT5) келтірілген болса да, оның көпшілікті деректерді қалай ағылшынша емес тапсырмаларда қалай жақсы жұмыс істеуі мүмкін емес. Бұл сұрақты зерттеу үшін көптеген диалекттер - араб тіліне mT5 қолданамыз. Бағалау үшін, ARabic тілді GENeration (ARGEN) үшін, жеті маңызды тапсырмаларды жазып жатқан романдық белгісін келтіреміз. Біз үлгі салыстыру үшін үш күшті араб T5 стилінің моделдерін алдын- ала үйренеміз және оларды ARGEN үшін бағалаймыз. Біздің жаңа үлгілеріміз барлық ARGEN тапсырмаларында (59 сынақтан 52- де) mT5- ден артық жұмыс істеп, бірнеше жаңа SOTAларды орнатылады. Біздің үлгілеріміз сондай-ақ соңғы таңдалған, үлкен араб тілдерінің түсініктері арLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Жаңа моделдеріміз көпшілікті қол жеткізеді. Мұндай-ақ ARGEN деректер қорларына қосымыз: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'mk': 'Пренесувањето на учењето со единствена трансформна рамка (T5) која ги претвора сите јазички проблеми во текст-во-текст формат неодамна беше предложено како едноставен и ефикасен пристап на трансформно учење. Иако беше воведена и мултијазична верзија на моделот T5 (mT5), не е јасно колку добро може да оди за неанглиските задачи кои вклучуваат различни податоци. За да го испитаме ова прашање, аплицираме mT5 на јазик со широка разлика на дијалекти - арапски. За евалуација, воведуваме нов референц за Генерација на Арабичкиот јазик (АРГЕН), кој покрива седум важни задачи. For model comparison, we pre-train three powerful Arabic T5-style models and evaluate them on ARGEN.  Although pre-trained with ~49 less data, our new models perform significantly better than mT5 on all ARGEN tasks (in 52 out of 59 test sets) and set several new SOTAs.  Нашите модели, исто така, воспоставуваат нова СОТА за неодамна предложената голема референтна оценка за разбирање на арапскиот јазик АРЛУЕ (Abdul-Mageed и ал., 2021). Нашите нови модели се јавно достапни. Ние, исто така, се поврзуваме со АРГЕН датотеки преку нашиот резервоар: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'mt': "It-tagħlim tat-trasferiment b’qafas unifikat tat-Trasferiment (T5) li jikkonverti l-problemi lingwistiċi kollha f’format test għal test ġie propost reċentement bħala approċċ sempliċi u effettiv tat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment. Għalkemm ġiet introdotta wkoll verżjoni multilingwi tal-mudell T5 (mT5), mhuwiex ċar kemm jista’ jkun tajjeb fuq kompiti mhux Ingliżi li jinvolvu dejta varjata. Biex ninvestigaw din il-mistoqsija, tapplika mT5 fuq lingwa b'varjetà wiesgħa ta' dijaletti - Għarab. Għall-evalwazzjoni, a ħna nintroduċu punt ta’ riferiment ġdid għall-ĠENERAZZJONI tal-lingwa ARABIKA (ARGEN), li jkopri seba’ kompiti importanti. Għall-paragun tal-mudelli, aħna nħarrġu minn qabel tliet mudelli qawwija bl-istil Għarab T5 u jivvalutawhom fuq ARGEN. Although pre-trained with ~49 less data, our new models perform significantly better than mT5 on all ARGEN tasks (in 52 out of 59 test sets) and set several new SOTAs.  Il-mudelli tagħna jistabbilixxu wkoll SOTA ġdida dwar il-punt ta’ riferiment għall-evalwazzjoni tal-fehim tal-lingwa Għarbija l-kbir propost reċentement ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Il-mudelli l-ġodda tagħna huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku. Għandna wkoll rabta mas-settijiet tad-dejta ARGEN permezz tar-repożitorju tagħna: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'ms': 'Pemindahan pembelajaran dengan kerangka Pemindah Bersatu (T5) yang menukar semua masalah bahasa ke format teks-ke-teks baru-baru ini dilaporkan sebagai pendekatan pembelajaran pemindahan sederhana dan efektif. Walaupun versi berbilang bahasa model T5 (mT5) juga diperkenalkan, tidak jelas seberapa baik ia boleh bertindak pada tugas bukan bahasa Inggeris yang melibatkan data berbeza. Untuk menyelidiki soalan ini, kami melaksanakan mT5 pada bahasa dengan pelbagai dialekt - Arab. Untuk penilaian, kami memperkenalkan tanda rujukan novel untuk ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN), meliputi tujuh tugas penting. Untuk perbandingan model, kita melatih tiga model gaya Arab T5 yang kuat dan menilai mereka di ARGEN. Walaupun dilatih-dilatih dengan ~49 data kurang, model baru kami melakukan lebih baik daripada mT5 pada semua tugas ARGEN (dalam 52 daripada 59 set ujian) dan menetapkan beberapa SOTA baru. Model kami juga menetapkan SOTA baru pada tanda pandangan pemahaman bahasa Arab yang baru-baru ini diusulkan, besar ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Model baru kita tersedia secara awam. Kami juga paut ke set data ARGEN melalui repositori kami: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ml': 'എല്ലാ ഭാഷ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെയും ടെക്സ്റ്റ്- ലേഖന രീതിയിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്ന പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് അടുത്തുതന്നെ ലളിതവും പ്രായോഗ്യവുമായ പഠി ടി5 മോഡലിന്റെ (എംടി5) പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും പതിപ്പു് പരിചയപ്പെട്ടിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങളുള്ള ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് അല്ലാത്ത ഈ ചോദ്യത്തെ അന്വേഷിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d എംടി5 ഭാഷയില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വിശാലമായ വിഭാഷകളുമായി അറബിക്കുകള വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d അരാബിക് ഭാഷയുടെ ജെനെറേഷന്\u200dറെ ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഏഴ്  മോഡല്\u200d താരതമ്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് ട്രെയിന്\u200d മൂന്ന് ശക്തിയുള്ള അറബിയിലെ ടി5-ശൈലിയുടെ മോഡല ~49 കുറഞ്ഞ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കിലും നമ്മുടെ പുതിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d എല്ലാ ആര്\u200dജെന്\u200d ജോലികളെക്കാളും നല്ലതാണ് പ്രവര്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലുകളും അടുത്തുതന്നെ പ്രായശ്ചിത്തത്തില്\u200d പുതിയ SOTA നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, വലിയ അറബി ഭാഷയിലെ ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ആര്\u200dലൂയ നമ്മുടെ പുതിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധമാണ്. നമ്മുടെ റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടറിലൂടെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ARGEN ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ കൂടെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നു: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'pl': 'Transfer learning za pomocą ujednoliconego frameworku Transformer (T5), który konwertuje wszystkie problemy językowe na format tekstowy, został ostatnio zaproponowany jako proste i skuteczne podejście do nauki transferowej. Chociaż wprowadzono również wielojęzyczną wersję modelu T5 (mT5), nie jest jasne, jak dobrze może sobie poradzić z zadaniami nieangielskimi obejmującymi różnorodne dane. Aby zbadać to pytanie, stosujemy mT5 na język z szeroką gamą dialektów – arabski. W celu oceny wprowadzamy nowatorski standard generacji języka ARabickiego (ARGEN), obejmujący siedem ważnych zadań. W celu porównania modeli wstępnie trenujemy trzy potężne arabskie modele T5 i oceniamy je na ARGEN. Chociaż wstępnie przeszkolone z ~49 mniejszą ilością danych, nasze nowe modele sprawdzają się znacznie lepiej niż mT5 we wszystkich zadaniach ARGEN (w 52 z 59 zestawów testowych) i ustawiają kilka nowych SOTAs. Nasze modele ustanawiają również nową SOTA na niedawno zaproponowanym, dużym standardzie oceny rozumienia języka arabskiego ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Nasze nowe modele są publicznie dostępne. Łączymy również do zbiorów danych ARGEN poprzez nasze repozytorium: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'mn': 'Бүх хэл асуудлуудыг текст-текст формат руу шилжүүлэх нэгтгэлтэй Трансформ (T5) болон суралцах сургалтыг саяхан энгийн болон эффективны шилжүүлэх арга зам болгон тайлбарласан. Т5 загварын олон хэлний хувилбар (mT5) нь мөн танилцуулсан ч өөр өөр өөр мэдээллийн тухай Англи бус үйл ажиллагаанд хэрхэн сайн ажиллаж болох вэ гэдгийг тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Энэ асуултыг судлах үед бид mT5-г олон төрлийн диалектуудын хэл дээр хэрэглэдэг. Дүндлийн тулд бид ARabic хэл GENeration (ARGEN) дээр 7 чухал ажлыг тайлбарлаж байгаа шинэ салбарыг танилцуулдаг. Тиймээс харьцуулахын тулд бид 3 хүчтэй Араб T5 хэлбэрийн загварыг суралцаж ARGEN дээр үнэлгээд үзнэ. Хэдийгээр ~49 бага өгөгдлийн сургалтын өмнө бидний шинэ загварууд бүх ARGEN ажил дээр mT5-аас илүү сайн ажилладаг (52-аас 59 шалгалтын багц) болон олон шинэ SOTAс гаргадаг. Бидний загварууд мөн саяхан дэвшүүлсэн, том Араб хэлний ойлголтын тоо баримт ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Бидний шинэ загварууд олон нийтэд хангалттай. Мөн бид ARGEN өгөгдлийн санг өөрсдийн repository-ээс холбож байна: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ro': 'Învățarea transferului cu un cadru unificat Transformer (T5) care convertește toate problemele lingvistice într-un format text-text a fost propusă recent ca o abordare simplă și eficientă a învățării transferului. Deși a fost introdusă și o versiune multilingvă a modelului T5 (mT5), nu este clar cât de bine se poate descurca în cazul sarcinilor non-engleze care implică date diverse. Pentru a investiga această întrebare, aplicăm mT5 pe o limbă cu o mare varietate de dialecte - arabă. Pentru evaluare, introducem un nou reper pentru generarea limbajului ARAbic (ARGEN), acoperind șapte sarcini importante. Pentru compararea modelelor, pregătim trei modele puternice în stil T5 arab și le evaluăm pe ARGEN. Deși sunt pre-instruite cu aproximativ 49 de date mai puține, noile noastre modele performează semnificativ mai bine decât mT5 la toate sarcinile ARGEN (în 52 din 59 de seturi de testare) și setează mai multe SOTA noi. Modelele noastre stabilesc, de asemenea, un nou SOTA pe criteriul de evaluare a înțelegerii limbii arabe ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Noile noastre modele sunt disponibile public. De asemenea, ne conectăm la seturile de date ARGEN prin intermediul depozitului nostru: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'no': 'Overfør læring med eit uniformert transformeringsrammeverk (T5) som konverterer alle språkproblemene til eit tekst- til- tekstformat er nyleg foreslått som ein enkel og effektiv læringstilnærming for overføring. Selv om ein fleirspråk versjon av T5-modellen (mT5) er også innført, er det ikkje klart kor godt det kan gå på ikkje-engelske oppgåver med ulike data. For å undersøke dette spørsmålet, bruker vi mT5 på eit språk med mange ulike dialektar - arabisk. For evaluering introduserer vi eit nytt benchmarkt for ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN), som dekkar sju viktige oppgåver. For sammenligning av modeller, treng vi tre kraftige arabiske T5-stilmodeller før og evaluerer dei på ARGEN. Selv om føretrained med ~49 mindre data, utfører våre nye modeller mykje bedre enn mT5 på alle ARGEN- oppgåver (i 52 av 59 testsett) og sett fleire nye SOTAr. Våre modeller finn også nytt SOTA på den nyleg foreslåde, stor arabiske språksforståande evalueringsbenchmarken ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Det nye modellen våre er tilgjengeleg offentlig. Vi lenkjer også til ARGEN-datasett gjennom arkivet vår: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje učenja sa ujedinjenim okvirom transformera (T5) koji pretvara sve jezičke probleme u tekst-na-tekst format nedavno je predloženo kao jednostavan i efikasni pristup učenja prijenosa. Iako je uvedena i multijezička verzija model a T5 (mT5), nije jasno koliko dobro može proći na ne-engleski zadatak uključujući različite podatke. Da bi istražili ovo pitanje, primjenjujemo mT5 na jezik sa širom raznim dijalektima - Arapskim. Za procjenu, predstavljamo novu kritiku za GENeraciju ARabičkog jezika (ARGEN), pokrivajući sedam važnih zadataka. Za usporedbu modela, pre treniramo tri moćne arapske modele T5 stila i procjenjujemo ih na ARGEN-u. Iako su predobučeni sa ~49 manjim podacima, naši novi modeli izvršavaju značajno bolje od mT5 na svim ARGEN zadacima (52 od 59 testova) i postavljaju nekoliko novih SOTA-a. Naši modeli su takođe uspostavili novu SOTA na nedavno predloženom, velikom broju razumijevanja Arapskog jezika ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Naši novi modeli su javno dostupni. Takoðe povezujemo i sa podacima ARGEN kroz naš skladište: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'si': 'සියළු භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාළුවෙන් පාළුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය සහ පරික්ෂිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට T5 මදුල්ය (mT5) ගොඩක් භාෂාවික සංවිධානයක් තියෙනවා නමුත් ඒක පැහැදිලි නැහැ විවිධ දත්ත සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න බැරි ඉං මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය පරීක්ෂා කරන්න, අපි mT5 භාෂයකට විශාල විශාල විදියට භාෂා කරන්න - අරාබික්. විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ARABIC භාෂාව GENeration (AGENS) සඳහා නියම බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එකක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, වැදගත් වැදගත් වැඩි 7 මොඩේල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි පුරුද්ධ අරාබික් T5-ශේලි මොඩේල් තුනක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා ඒ වග ඔක්කොම අලුත් දත්ත තියෙන ~49 විතරයි, අපේ අලුත් මොඩේල්ස් මොඩේල්ස් හැම අලුත් අලුත් අලුත් අලුත් SOTAs වලට mT5 වඩා වඩා හොඳයි (52 වි අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක අලුත් SOTA ස්ථාපනය කරන්නේ අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ලොකු අරාබි භාෂාව තේරුම් ගන්න බෙන්චමාර්ක් ARLUE අපේ අලුත් මෝඩේල් සාර්ථක විදියට ලැබෙන්නේ. අපි ආර්ජෙන් දත්ත සේට් එක්ක අපේ සංකේතයෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'so': "Waxbarashada waxaa ugu dhowaad looga soo jeediyey qaab fudud oo faa’iido ah oo ku wareejinaya dhibaatooyinka luuqada oo dhan oo u bedela foomka text-to-text. In kastoo lagu soo bandhigay tusaale ahaan T5 (mT5) oo luuqado kala duduwan, ma cad karo sidoo kale si wanaagsan looga shaqeyn karo shaqooyin aan ingiriisiga ahayn oo ku saabsan macluumaad kala duduwan. Si aan u baaritaano su'aalahan, waxaynu ku codsanaynaa mT5 luuqad oo kala duduwan luuqado- Carabi ah. Qiimeynta waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qoraal warqad ah oo ku qoran toddoba shaqo muhiim ah. Tusaale ahaan tusaale ahaan, waxaynu horay u tababarinnaa saddex qaab oo xoog leh oo af Carabi ah T5, waxaana qiimeynaynaa arimaha ARGEN. In kastoo lagu tababaray ~49 data ka yar, modelalkayaga cusub ayaa aad uga wanaagsan mT5 shaqooyinka ARGEN oo dhan (52 ka mid ah 59 samooyinka test) waxayna sameynaysaa SOTAs cusub. Tilmaamahayaga ayaa sidoo kale sameynaya SOTA cusub ee ugu dhowaad la soo jeeday waxgarashada afka Carabi ee weyn ee qiimeynta qiimeynta afka ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Tusaale cusub waxay si bayaan ah u helaan. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku xirnaa macluumaadyada ARGEN ee ku qoran warqadeena: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'sv': 'Transfer learning med ett enhetligt Transformer-ramverk (T5) som omvandlar alla språkproblem till ett text-till-text-format föreslogs nyligen som en enkel och effektiv överföringsinlärningsmetod. Även om en flerspråkig version av T5-modellen (mT5) också infördes, är det inte klart hur bra den kan klara sig för icke-engelska uppgifter som omfattar olika data. För att undersöka denna fråga tillämpar vi mT5 på ett språk med en mängd olika dialekter - arabiska. För utvärdering introducerar vi ett nytt riktmärke för ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN), som täcker sju viktiga uppgifter. För modelljämförelse förbereder vi tre kraftfulla arabiska T5-modeller och utvärderar dem på ARGEN. Även om de är förberedda med cirka 49 färre data, presterar våra nya modeller betydligt bättre än mT5 på alla ARGEN-uppgifter (i 52 av 59 testset) och sätter flera nya SOTA:er. Våra modeller etablerar också ny SOTA på det nyligen föreslagna, stora utvärderingsvärdet för arabiska språkförståelse ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Våra nya modeller är tillgängliga för allmänheten. Vi länkar också till ARGEN dataset via vårt arkiv: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ta': 'ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட மாற்று சட்டத்துடன் கற்றலை மாற்றுகிறது. அது அனைத்து மொழிகளின் பிரச்சனைகளையும் உரையில் இருந்து உரை வடிவமாக மாற்றும்.  T5 மாதிரியின் பல மொழி பதிப்பு (mT5) முனையமைக்கப்பட்டாலும், பல தரவுகளுடன் உள்ள ஆங்கிலம் இல்லாத பணிகளில் அது எவ்வளவு நன்றாக நடக்க முடியும் என்பது  இந்த கேள்வியை ஆய்வு செய்ய, நாம் எம்டி5 மொழியில் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மொழியில் பல்வேறு விளக்கச்சீட்ட மதிப்பீட்டிற்கு, நாம் ஆராபிக் மொழி GENEration (ARGEN) க்கான ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பை அறிவிக்கிறோம், ஏழு முக்கியமான பணிகளை மறை மாதிரி ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு, நாம் முன்னால் பயிற்சி மூன்று சக்தியுள்ள அரபி டி5 பாணிகள் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்து AR ~49 குறைவான தரவுடன் முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டாலும், எங்கள் புதிய மாதிரிகள் எம்டி5 ஐ விட முக்கியமாக செயல்படுத்துகின்றன அனைத்து ARGEN பணிகளிலும் ( Our models also establish new SOTA on the recently-proposed, large Arabic language understanding evaluation benchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021).  எங்கள் புதிய மாதிரிகள் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும். நாம் ARGEN தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு இணைக்கிறோம் நம் கிடங்கிலிருந்து: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ur': 'ایک متحدہ ترنسفور فرمینٹ (T5) کے ساتھ سکھانے کی ترنسفور کرتی ہے جو تمام زبان مشکلات کو متن-ٹیکسٹ فورمٹ میں تبدیل کرتی ہے اچھے وقت ایک ساده اور اثر تغییر سکھانے کی طرح پیشنهاد کی گئی تھی۔ Although a multilingual version of the T5 model (mT5) was also introduced, it is not clear how well it can fare on non-English tasks involving various data. اس سؤال کی تحقیق کرنے کے لئے ہم mT5 کو ایک زبان پر لکھتے ہیں اور بہت سی مختلف دیالکتوں کے ساتھ -عربی. ارتباط کے لئے ہم ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN) کے لئے ایک نئی بنچم مارک پیش کرتے ہیں، سات اہم کام پورے کرتے ہیں۔ مدل مقایسہ کے لئے ہم تین طاقتور عربی T5 استیل مدل کو پیش ترین کرتے ہیں اور ان کو ARGEN کے ذریعہ ارزش کرتے ہیں. اگرچہ ~49 کم ڈیٹا کے ساتھ پیش آموزش کی گئی تھی، ہمارے نئی نمڈل تمام ARGEN کارکوں پر mT5 سے زیادہ بہتر عمل کرتے ہیں (52 میں 59 تست سٹ میں) اور بہت سی نوی SOTAS مقرر کرتے ہیں۔ اور ہمارے مدلکوں نے اچھے سے پیش کیا ہے، بڑی عربی زبان سمجھنے والی آرلوی (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021) کے بارے میں نیا سوٹا بنایا ہے۔ ہمارے نئے نمڈلے ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں۔ ہم نے آرژن ڈیٹ سٹ کو بھی ہمارے رپوسٹر کے ذریعہ لینک کیا: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'uz': "Name Agar T5 modelning bir necha tillar versiyasi (mT5) ichida ishlatilgan boʻlsa, har xil maʼlumot turli ingliz vazifalarda qanday yaxshi bajarishi mumkin emas. Bu savol qidirish uchun, biz mT5 tilda ko'p turli dialektlar bilan qoʻllayapmiz. For evaluation, we introduce a novel benchmark for ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN), covering seven important tasks.  Masalan o'xshash uchun biz uchta kuchli arab T5 uslublarini o'rganamiz va ularni ARGEN'da qiymatimiz. Agar ~49 dan kichik maʼlumot bilan o'rganishdan oldin boʻlsa, yangi modellar hamma ARGEN vazifalarda mT5 dan juda yaxshi bajariladi va bir necha yangi SOTA'larni oʻrnatadi. Yaqinda ishlatilgan, eng katta arab tilni o'rganish uchun yangi SOTAni o'zgartiradi (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Yangi modellar ochiq mavjud. Biz AGEN maʼlumotlar tarkibini xabarga bogʻ'liqchimiz: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'vi': 'Truyền tập tin qua một bộ chế biến hình thống nhất (T5) biến tất cả các vấn đề ngôn ngữ thành dạng văn bản sang văn bản đã được đề nghị gần đây như là một phương pháp học chuyển nhượng đơn giản và hiệu quả. Mặc dù đã được đưa ra một phiên bản đa dạng của mẫu T5 (mT5) cũng được viết, nhưng không rõ nó có thể hoạt động tốt với các công việc không phải Tiếng Anh liên quan đến các dữ liệu khác nhau. Để điều tra câu hỏi này, chúng tôi áp dụng M45 với ngôn ngữ có nhiều phương ngữ khác nhau... tiếng Ả Rập. Để đánh giá, chúng tôi sẽ đưa ra một tiêu chuẩn mới cho luận văn ngôn ngữ ARabic (ARGEN) bao gồm bảy nhiệm vụ quan trọng. Để so sánh mô hình, chúng tôi khởi tạo trước ba mẫu thời đại T5 Á Rập và đánh giá chúng trên ARGEN. Mặc dù đã được huấn luyện ít dữ liệu hơn 42, nhưng mẫu mới của chúng ta thực hiện tốt hơn mT5 với tất cả các công việc ARGEN (trong 5M ngoài bộ bài kiểm tra 59) và thiết lập nhiều SOTA mới. Các mẫu của chúng tôi cũng thiết lập SOTA mới về tập hợp hợp ngôn ngữ A-rập phát triển gần đây (Abdor-Mageed et al., 2021). Những mẫu mới của chúng tôi công khai. Chúng tôi cũng liên kết dữ liệu ARGEN qua kho lưu trữ. https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'nl': "Transfer learning met een uniform Transformer framework (T5) dat alle taalproblemen omzet in een tekst-naar-tekst formaat werd onlangs voorgesteld als een eenvoudige en effectieve transfer learning aanpak. Hoewel ook een meertalige versie van het T5-model (mT5) werd geïntroduceerd, is het niet duidelijk hoe goed het kan presteren bij niet-Engelse taken met uiteenlopende gegevens. Om deze vraag te onderzoeken, passen we mT5 toe op een taal met een grote verscheidenheid aan dialecten--Arabisch. Voor evaluatie introduceren we een nieuwe benchmark voor ARabic language GENeratie (ARGEN), die zeven belangrijke taken bestrijkt. Voor modelvergelijking trainen we drie krachtige Arabische T5-modellen vooraf en evalueren ze op ARGEN. Hoewel voorgetraind met ~49 minder data, presteren onze nieuwe modellen beduidend beter dan mT5 op alle ARGEN taken (in 52 van 59 testsets) en zetten verschillende nieuwe SOTA's in. Onze modellen vestigen ook nieuwe SOTA op de onlangs voorgestelde, grote evaluatie benchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Onze nieuwe modellen zijn publiekelijk beschikbaar. We linken ook naar ARGEN datasets via onze repository: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'bg': 'Наскоро беше предложено трансферно обучение с единна трансформаторна рамка (Т5), която преобразува всички езикови проблеми в текстов формат като прост и ефективен подход за трансферно обучение. Въпреки че беше въведена и многоезична версия на модела T5 (mT5), не е ясно колко добре може да се справи при задачи, които не са на английски език, включващи различни данни. За да проучим този въпрос, ние прилагаме на език с голямо разнообразие от диалекти - арабски. За оценка въвеждаме нов еталон за генериране на арабски език (АРГЕН), обхващащ седем важни задачи. За сравнение на моделите предварително тренираме три мощни арабски модела в стил Т5 и ги оценяваме на АРГЕН. Въпреки че са предварително обучени с ~49 по-малко данни, новите ни модели се представят значително по-добре от МТ5 при всички задачи на АРГЕН (в 52 от 59 тестови комплекта) и зададоха няколко нови SOTA. Нашите модели също така установяват нов SOTA върху наскоро предложения, голям референтен показател за оценка на разбирането на арабския език ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Новите ни модели са публично достъпни. Ние също така свързваме към набори от данни чрез нашето хранилище: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'da': "Overførsel af læring med en samlet Transformer framework (T5), der konverterer alle sprogproblemer til et tekst-til-tekst format, blev for nylig foreslået som en enkel og effektiv overførsel af læring tilgang. Selv om der også blev indført en flersproget version af T5-modellen (mT5), er det ikke klart, hvor godt den kan klare sig på ikke-engelske opgaver, der involverer forskellige data. For at undersøge dette spørgsmål anvender vi mT5 på et sprog med en bred vifte af dialekter - arabisk. Til evaluering introducerer vi et nyt benchmark for ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN), der dækker syv vigtige opgaver. Til model sammenligning forudtræner vi tre kraftfulde arabiske T5-modeller og evaluerer dem på ARGEN. Selvom vores nye modeller er prætrænet med ca. 49 færre data, klarer de sig betydeligt bedre end mT5 på alle ARGEN-opgaver (i 52 ud af 59 testsæt) og sætter flere nye SOTA'er. Vores modeller etablerer også ny SOTA på det nyligt foreslåede, store arabiske sprogforståelsesvurderingsbenchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Vores nye modeller er offentligt tilgængelige. Vi linker også til ARGEN datasæt gennem vores lager: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'id': 'Transfer belajar dengan rangka Transformer (T5) yang bersatu yang mengubah semua masalah bahasa menjadi format teks-ke-teks baru-baru ini diusulkan sebagai pendekatan belajar transfer sederhana dan efektif. Although a multilingual version of the T5 model (mT5) was also introduced, it is not clear how well it can fare on non-English tasks involving diverse data.  Untuk menyelidiki pertanyaan ini, kami menerapkan mT5 pada bahasa dengan berbagai dialekt - bahasa Arab. Untuk evaluasi, kami memperkenalkan benchmark novel untuk ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN), meliputi tujuh tugas penting. Untuk perbandingan model, kami melatih tiga model gaya Arab T5 yang kuat dan mengevaluasinya di ARGEN. Meskipun pra-dilatih dengan ~49 kurang data, model baru kami melakukan lebih baik dari mT5 pada semua tugas ARGEN (dalam 52 dari 59 set tes) dan menetapkan beberapa SOTA baru. Model kami juga mendirikan SOTA baru pada benchmark pemahaman bahasa Arab yang baru-baru ini diusulkan besar ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Model baru kita tersedia publik. Kami juga menghubungkan dataset ARGEN melalui repositori kami: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'de': 'Transfer Learning mit einem einheitlichen Transformer Framework (T5), das alle Sprachprobleme in ein Text-zu-Text-Format konvertiert, wurde kürzlich als einfacher und effektiver Transfer Learning Ansatz vorgeschlagen. Obwohl auch eine mehrsprachige Version des T5-Modells (mT5) eingeführt wurde, ist nicht klar, wie gut es bei nicht-englischen Aufgaben mit vielfältigen Daten auskommen kann. Um diese Frage zu untersuchen, wenden wir mT5 auf eine Sprache mit einer Vielzahl von Dialekten an – Arabisch. Zur Evaluation führen wir einen neuen Benchmark für ARabic language GENeration (ARGEN) ein, der sieben wichtige Aufgaben abdeckt. Zum Modellvergleich trainieren wir drei leistungsstarke arabische T5-Modelle vor und bewerten diese auf ARGEN. Obwohl sie mit ~49 weniger Daten vortrainiert sind, schneiden unsere neuen Modelle bei allen ARGEN-Aufgaben (in 52 von 59-Testsätzen) deutlich besser ab als mT5 und setzen mehrere neue SOTAs. Unsere Modelle etablieren auch neue SOTA auf dem kürzlich vorgeschlagenen, großen arabischen Sprachverständnisbewertungs-Benchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Unsere neuen Modelle sind öffentlich verfügbar. Wir verlinken auch über unser Repository auf ARGEN-Datensätze: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'fa': 'انتقال یادگیری با یک چهارچوب تغییر دهنده متحد (T5) که همه مشکلات زبان را به یک شکل متن به متن متن تبدیل می\u200cکند، اخیرا به عنوان یک دستور یادگیری ساده و موثر تغییر داده شده است. اگرچه یک نسخه بسیاری زبان مدل T5 (mT5) همچنین معرفی شد، مشخص نیست که چقدر خوب می\u200cتواند در کار غیر انگلیسی با اطلاعات مختلف در کار کند. برای تحقیق این سوال، ما mT5 را روی یک زبان با مختلف دیالکت های مختلف - عربی استفاده می کنیم. برای ارزیابی، ما یک مقدار نویسی برای ژنراتیک زبان ARabic (ARGEN) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که هفت کار مهم است. برای مقایسه مدل، ما پیش از این سه مدل قابل عربی T5 را آموزش می دهیم و آنها را در ARGEN ارزش می دهیم. اگرچه پیش از آموزش با داده های ~49 کمتر، مدلهای جدید ما به طور معنی بهتر از mT5 روی تمام کارهای ARGEN (در 52 از 59 تنظیم آزمایش) انجام می دهند و چند تنظیم SOTAS جدید انجام می دهند. مدلهای ما همچنین SOTA جدید را در مورد ارزیابی ارزیابی درک بزرگ زبان عربی (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021) قرار دادند. مدلهای جدید ما به طور عمومی موجود هستند. ما همچنین با مجموعه داده\u200cهای ARGEN از طریق ذخیره\u200cی ما ارتباط می\u200cکنیم: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ko': '통일 변환 프레임워크(T5)를 바탕으로 하는 이동 학습은 간단하고 효과적인 이동 학습 방법으로 이 프레임워크는 모든 언어 문제를 텍스트에서 텍스트로 변환하는 형식이다.T5모델(mT5)도 다국어 버전을 도입했지만 서로 다른 데이터와 관련된 비영어 임무에서 어떻게 표현되는지는 아직 알 수 없다.이 문제를 연구하기 위해서 우리는 mT5를 여러 가지 사투리가 있는 언어인 아랍어에 응용할 것이다.평가를 위해 우리는 7가지 중요한 임무를 포함하는 새로운 아랍어 생성 기준(ARGEN)을 도입했다.모델 비교를 위해 우리는 세 개의 강력한 아랍어 T5 스타일 모델을 미리 훈련시키고 ARGEN에서 그것들을 평가했다.비록 우리의 새 모델이 미리 훈련한 데이터가 약 49개 적지만 모든 ARGEN 작업(59개 테스트 집중의 52개 테스트 집합)에서 우리의 새 모델의 성능은 mT5보다 현저히 우수하고 몇 개의 새로운 SOTA를 설치했다.우리 모델은 최근 제시된 대형 아랍어 이해 평가 기준인 ARLUE(Abdul Mageed 등·2021년)에 따라 새로운 SOTA도 구축했다.우리의 새 모델은 공개된 것이다.또한 저장소를 통해 ARGEN 데이터 세트에 링크합니다.https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri kujifunza kwa mfumo wa Tafsiri (T5) ambao hugeuza matatizo yote ya lugha katika mfumo wa simu za maandishi ulipendekezwa hivi karibuni kama njia rahisi na yenye ufanisi wa kuhamisha kujifunza. Ingawa toleo la lugha mbalimbali la modeli ya T5 (mT5) pia lilianzishwa, haijaeleweka ni namna gani inaweza kufanikiwa katika kazi zisizo za Kiingereza zinazohusisha takwimu mbalimbali. Kuchunguza swali hili, tunatumia mT5 kwa lugha yenye lugha mbalimbali - Kiarabu. Kwa uchunguzi, tunaonyesha bendera ya kitabu kwa ajili ya GENERA ya lugha ya Kiarabu (ARGEN), inayohusu kazi saba muhimu. Kwa kulinganisha mfano, tunafunza mitindo mitatu yenye nguvu ya Kiarabu T5 na kutathmini katika ARGEN. Ingawa mafunzo ya awali na takwimu 49 zisizo chini, mifano yetu mpya hufanya vizuri zaidi ya mT5 katika kazi zote za ARGEN (katika seti 52 kati ya 59) na kutengeneza SOTA mpya. Our models also establish new SOTA on the recently-proposed, large Arabic language understanding evaluation benchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021).  Mifano yetu mpya yanapatikana kwa uwazi. Pia tunaunganisha na taarifa za ARGEN kupitia hifadhi yetu: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'tr': "Öwrenmegi birden terjime etmek üçin (T5) ähli dil meselelerini metin-täze bir şekilde üýtgeden bir terjime çerçewçisi bilen geçir. T5 modeliniň bir köp dilli wersiýasy (mT5) hem üýtgedilen bolsa beýleki maglumatlar bilen iňlisçe döwletlerde nähili gowy bolup biler däldir. Bu soragy barlamak üçin, biz mT5 diline örän görnüş dialektler bilen uygulaýarys. Ýardamçylyk üçin ARabik dili GENeration (ARGEN) üçin, yedi möhüm zady täzeýäris. Şeýleşme üçin, üç güýçli Arapça T5-stil nusgalaryny öňünden öwrenip ARGEN'da deňleýäris. Eýöne ~49 kiçi maglumat bilen öňünde eğlenmiş olsa da, täze modellerimiz mT5'den hemme ARGEN işinde (52-iň 59 test setinde) täze bir sany SOTAny taýýarlapdyr. Biziň modellerimiz hem soňra teklip eden, uly arapça dillerin çykyş benchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Biziň täze nusgalarymyz publika bar. Biz hem ARGEN veri setirlere öz deposimizden baglaýarys: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'sq': 'Transferimi i mësimit me një kuadër të unifikuar Transformer (T5) që i konverton të gjitha problemet gjuhësore në një format teksti në tekst u propozua kohët e fundit si një qasje e thjeshtë dhe efektive mësimi transferimi. Megjithëse u fut gjithashtu një version shumëgjuhës i model it T5 (mT5), nuk është e qartë se sa mirë mund të jetë në detyrat jo-angleze që përfshijnë të dhëna të ndryshme. Për të hetuar këtë pyetje, ne aplikojmë mT5 në një gjuhë me një varietet të gjerë dialektesh - arabisht. Për vlerësim, ne paraqesim një normë të re për Gjeneracionin e gjuhës arabe (ARGEN), që mbulon shtatë detyra të rëndësishme. Për krahasimin e modeleve, ne paratrajnojmë tre modele të fuqishëm arabë të stilit T5 dhe i vlerësojmë në ARGEN. Megjithëse paratrajnuar me ~49 më pak të dhëna, modelet tona të reja bëjnë më mirë se mT5 në të gjitha detyrat ARGEN (në 52 nga 59 grupet e provave) dhe vendosin disa SOTA të reja. Modelet tona krijojnë gjithashtu SOTA të re mbi normën e madhe për vlerësimin e kuptimit të gjuhës arabe të propozuar kohët e fundit ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Modelet tona të reja janë në dispozicion publik. Ne lidhim gjithashtu me të dhënat ARGEN nëpërmjet repozitorisë sonë: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'am': 'እና የT5 ዓይነቶች (mT5) ብዙዎች የቋንቋ ክፍል ቢገልጸም ግን በተለያዩ ዳታዎች ውስጥ በንግግሊዝኛ ስራ እንዴት ያህል እንዲጠቀም አይገልጽም፡፡ ይህንን ጥያቄ ለመመርመርመርመር፣ በቋንቋ mT5 ላይ በተለየ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ለማስተዋል የአርቢክ ቋንቋ GENER (ARGEN) የተባለው ሰባት አስፈላጊ ስራዎችን ለማድረግ የኖሮውን የቅርጽ መጻሕፍት እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ ምሳሌ፣ ሦስት ኃይለኛ የዐረብኛ የT5 ዓይነት ምሳሌዎችን ለመግለጽ እናሳውቃቸዋለን፡፡ ከ ~49 ትንሹ ዳታዎች ቢሆን አዲስ ሞዴላዎቻችን ከአርጌን ስራ ሁሉ በላጭ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ ሞዴላዎቻችን ደግሞ አዲስ አዲስ SOTA በመጀመሪያው በተፈቀደ፣ ታላቁ የዐረብኛ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል አርጉም አርጉስ (አብবদል-ማጉዲድ እና አል., 2021) ላይ አዲስ ማስታወቂያውን ያስተካክላሉ፡፡ አዲስ ሞዴላዎቻችን ገልጸዋል፡፡ አርج ዳታዎችን በመዝገብ ማሰሪያ እናስገባለን፡ https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje učenja s ujedinjenim okvirom transformera (T5) koji pretvara sve jezičke probleme u tekst-na-tekst format nedavno je predloženo kao jednostavan i učinkoviti pristup učenja prijenosa. Iako je uvedena i multijezička verzija model a T5 (mT5), nije jasno koliko dobro može proći na ne-engleski zadatak uključujući različite podatke. Da bi istražili ovo pitanje, primjenjujemo mT5 na jezik sa širom raznim dijalektima - arapskim. Za procjenu, predstavljamo novu kritiku za GENeraciju ARabičkog jezika (ARGEN), pokrivajući sedam važnih zadataka. Za usporedbu modela, predvježbamo tri moćne arapske modele T5 stila i procjenjujemo ih na ARGEN. Iako su predobučeni ~49 manjim podacima, naši novi modeli izvode značajno bolje od mT5 na svim ARGEN zadacima (u 52 od 59 testova) i postavljaju nekoliko novih SOTAsa. Naši modeli su također uspostavili novi SOTA na nedavno predloženom, velikom kriteriju razumijevanja razumijevanja arapskog jezika ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Naši novi modeli su javno dostupni. Također povezujemo i sa ARGEN podacima kroz naš skladište: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'af': "Oordrag leer met 'n eenvoudige Transformer raamwerk (T5) wat alle taal probleme omskakel in 'n teks- na- teks formaat is onlangs voorgestel as 'n eenvoudige en effektief oordrag leer toegang. Alhoewel 'n veelvuldige weergawe van die T5 model (mT5) ook ingevoer is, is dit nie duidelik hoe goed dit kan voortgaan op nie-Engels taak wat verskeie data invoer. Om hierdie vraag te ondersoek, sal ons mT5 op 'n taal toewend met 'n wyse verskillende dialekte - Arabiese. Vir evaluering, introduseer ons 'n nuwe benchmark vir ARabic taal GENeration (ARGEN), met die dekking van sewe belangrike taak. Vir model vergelyking, trein ons drie kragtige Arabiese T5-styl modele voor en evalueer hulle op ARGEN. Alhoewel voor- opgelei met ~49 minder data, ons nuwe modele uitvoer beter as mT5 op alle ARGEN opdragte (in 52 uit 59 toets stel) en stel verskeie nuwe SOTAS. Ons modele stel ook nuwe SOTA op die onlangs voorgestelde, groot Arabiese taal verstaan evalueringsbenchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Ons nuwe modele is openlik beskikbaar. Ons skakel ook na ARGEN datastel deur ons stoorplek: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'bn': 'একটি একত্রিত ট্রান্সফ্রেম ফ্রেম (টি৫) দ্বারা শিক্ষা পরিবর্তন করুন যা সকল ভাষার সমস্যাকে টেক্সট- থেকে টেক্সট ফর্ম্যাটে পরিবর্তন করা হয়ে যদিও টি৫ মডেল (এমটি৫) এর একটি বহুভাষার সংস্করণ চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছিল, তবুও এটা পরিষ্কার নয় যে বিভিন্ন তথ্যের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভি এই প্রশ্ন অনুসন্ধান করার জন্য আমরা এমটি৫ ভাষায় প্রয়োগ করি বিভিন্ন ভাষায় - আরবী। মূল্যায়নের জন্য আমরা আরাবিক ভাষার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজের সাতটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ সম্পর্কে একটি উপন্যাস বেনম্যাক্কের মডেলের তুলনার জন্য আমরা তিনটি শক্তিশালী আরবী টি৫ স্টাইল মডেলের পূর্বে ট্রেন প্রদান করি আর্জেনে তাদের মূল্যায়ন করি। যদিও পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ~৪৯ এর কম তথ্য দিয়ে আমাদের নতুন মডেল আরজেনের সকল কাজের (৫৯ টেস্ট সেটের মধ্যে ৫২ থেকে) প্রদর্শন করে বেশ কিছু নতুন এসওটার নি আমাদের মডেলও সাম্প্রতিক প্রস্তাবিত আরবী ভাষার ব্যাঙ্কমার্ক আর্লুই (আব্দুল-মাগিদের এল, ২০২১) নিয়ে নতুন সোটাও প্রতিষ্ঠান করে। আমাদের নতুন মডেল প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে। আমাদের রিপোর্টির মাধ্যমে আমরা আর্জেন ডাটাসেটের সাথে লিঙ্ক করি: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'az': "Bütün dil problemlərini mətn-mətn format ına döndərən bir birləşdirici Transformer frameworku (T5) ilə öyrənməyi son zamanlarda basit və effektiv öyrənmə metodu olaraq təbliğ edildi. T5 modelinin çoxlu dilli versiyası (mT5) də təşkil edilməsə də, müxtəlif məlumatları ilə birlikdə İngilizə olmayan işlərdə nə qədər yaxşı iş edə bilər bilmir. Bu sualını araşdırmaq üçün, müxtəlif dialektlərlə mT5 dilini ərəb dilində istifadə edirik. Vəziyyət üçün ARabic dili GENeration (ARGEN) üçün yeni bir benchmark təyin edirik, yeddi möhüm işləri örtürük. Model karşılaşdırma üçün üç güclü ərəb T5 stili modellərini öyrəndik və ARGEN ilə değerləşdiririk. Əgər ~49 daha az verilən təhsil edilmiş olsa da, yeni modellərimiz bütün ARGEN işlərində (52 ilə 59 sınamaq setlərində) mT5'dən daha yaxşı işlər edir və birçox yeni SOTAlar təyin edirlər. Bizim modellərimiz yeni təbliğ edilmiş, böyük ərəb dilində anlama müəyyən etiketi ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Yeni modellərimiz açıq-aşkar mövcuddur. Biz də ARGEN veri qurğuları depositeyimizlə bağlayırıq: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'hy': 'Վերջերս ուսումնասիրությունը փոխանցվում է միավոր փոխակերպման կառուցվածքով (T5), որը փոխակերպում է բոլոր լեզվի խնդիրները տեքստի-տեքստի ֆորմատ, առաջարկվել է որպես պարզ և արդյունավետ փոխակերպման ուսումնասիրություն Չնայած, որ T5 մոդելի (mT5) բազլեզու տարբերակը ներկայացվել է նաև, պարզ չէ, թե ինչքան լավ է այն կարող աշխատել ոչ անգլերեն խնդիրների վրա, որոնք ներառում են բազմազան տվյալներ: Այս հարցի ուսումնասիրելու համար մենք mT5-ը կիրառում ենք մի լեզվի վրա, որն ունի բազմաթիվ դիալեկտներ՝ արաբերեն: Ագնահատելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք ARAB-ի լեզվի գեներացիայի նոր համեմատային նպատակ, որը ներառում է եօթը կարևոր խնդիրներ: Մոդելների համեմատության համար մենք նախապատրաստում ենք երեք հզոր արաբական T5-ոճի մոդելներ և գնահատում ենք դրանք ARGS-ի միջոցով: Չնայած, որ նախապատրաստված է ավելի քիչ տվյալներով, մեր նոր մոդելներն ավելի լավ են աշխատում, քան mT5-ը բոլոր ARGS-ի առաջադրանքների վրա (59 փորձարկումներից 52-ից) և որոշ նոր SOT-ներ են կազմում: Մեր մոդելները նաև ստեղծում են նոր SOTOA-ը վերջերս առաջարկված, մեծ արաբական լեզվի հասկանալու գնահատման համեմատային նպատակի ARLuE (Աբդուլ-Մագեդ և այլն., 2021 թ․). Մեր նոր մոդելները հասանելի են: We also link to ARGEN datasets through our repository:  https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje učenja sa ujedinjenim okvirom transformera (T5) koji pretvara sve jezičke probleme u tekst-na-tekst format nedavno je predloženo kao jednostavan i efikasni pristup učenja prijenosa. Iako je uvedena i multijezička verzija model a T5 (mT5), nije jasno koliko dobro može proći na ne-engleski zadatak uključujući različite podatke. Da bi istražili ovo pitanje, primjenjujemo mT5 na jezik sa širom raznim dijalektima - Arapskim. Za procjenu, predstavljamo novu kritiku za GENeraciju ARabičkog jezika (ARGEN), pokrivajući sedam važnih zadataka. Za usporedbu modela, predvježbamo tri moćne arapske modele T5 stila i procjenjujemo ih na ARGEN-u. Iako su predobučeni ~49 manjim podacima, naši novi modeli izvršavaju značajno bolje od mT5 na svim ARGEN zadacima (52 od 59 testova) i postavljaju nekoliko novih SOTAsa. Naši modeli su također uspostavili novu SOTA na nedavno predloženom, velikom kriteriju razumijevanja razumijevanja arapskog jezika ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Naši novi modeli su javno dostupni. Također povezujemo i sa podacima ARGEN kroz naš skladište: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge de transfer ència amb un marc de transformació unificat (T5) que converteix tots els problemes lingüístics en un format de text a text va ser proposat recentment com un enfocament d'aprenentatge simple i efectiu de transferència. Although a multilingual version of the T5 model (mT5) was also introduced, it is not clear how well it can fare on non-English tasks involving diverse data.  Per investigar aquesta pregunta, aplicam mT5 en una llengua amb una gran varietat de dialectes, àrab. Per a l'evaluació, introduim un nou punt de referència per a la generació de llenguatges aràbics (ARGEN), que cobreix set tasques importants. Per a comparar models, preparem tres models àrabs poderosos d'estil T5 i els evaluem en ARGEN. Malgrat que els nostres nous models prenguin una capacitat previa amb ~49 menys dades, els nostres nous models actuen significativament millor que mT5 en totes les tasques ARGEN (en 52 de cada 59 conjunts de prova) i posen diverses noves SOTA. Els nostres models també establezen un nou SOTA sobre el punt de referència de recent proposat d'una gran evaluació de la comprensió del llenguatge àrab ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Els nostres nous models estan disponibles al públic. També connectem als conjunts de dades ARGEN a través del nostre repositori: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'cs': 'Jako jednoduchý a efektivní přístup k transferovému učení byl nedávno navržen přenos učení s jednotným frameworkem Transformer (T5), který převádí všechny jazykové problémy do formátu text-na-text. Ačkoli byla zavedena i vícejazyčná verze modelu T5 (mT5), není jasné, jak dobře se může dařit na neanglické úkoly zahrnující různá data. Abychom tuto otázku zkoumali, aplikujeme mT5 na jazyk s širokou škálou dialektů – arabština. Pro hodnocení představujeme nový benchmark pro ARabickou generaci jazyka (ARGEN), který pokrývá sedm důležitých úkolů. Pro srovnání modelů předtrénujeme tři výkonné arabské modely T5 a vyhodnocujeme je na ARGEN. Ačkoli jsou předem trénovány s ~49 méně dat, naše nové modely výrazně lepší než mT5 ve všech ARGEN úlohách (ve 52 z 59 testovacích sad) a nastavují několik nových SOTAs. Naše modely také zavádějí novou SOTA na nedávno navrženém, velkém benchmarku pro hodnocení porozumění arabskému jazyku ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Naše nové modely jsou veřejně dostupné. Odkazujeme také na datové sady ARGEN prostřednictvím našeho repozitáře: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'et': 'Hiljuti pakuti välja lihtsa ja tõhusa siirdeõppe lähenemisviisina, mis muudab kõik keeleprobleemid tekstist tekstiks vormingusse. Kuigi T5 mudeli mitmekeelne versioon (mT5) võeti kasutusele ka mitmekeelne versioon, ei ole selge, kui hästi see suudab toimida mitmekesiste andmetega seotud ülesannete puhul, mis ei ole inglise keeles. Selle küsimuse uurimiseks rakendame mT5 keelele, millel on palju erinevaid murdeid - araabia keel. Hindamiseks tutvustame ARabi keele generatsiooni (ARGEN) uut võrdlusalust, mis hõlmab seitse olulist ülesannet. Mudelite võrdlemiseks eeltreenime kolme võimsat araabia T5-stiilis mudelit ja hindame neid ARGEN-il. Kuigi meie uued mudelid on eelnevalt koolitatud umbes 49 vähem andmeid, on kõigil ARGENi ülesannetel märkimisväärselt paremad kui mT5 (52 katsekomplektis 59-st) ja seadsid mitu uut SOTA-d. Meie mudelid loovad ka uue SOTA hiljuti välja pakutud suure araabia keele mõistmise hindamise võrdlusaluse ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed jt., 2021). Meie uued mudelid on avalikult kättesaadavad. Samuti lingime ARGENi andmekogumitega oma hoidla kaudu: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'fi': 'Yksinkertaiseksi ja tehokkaaksi siirtooppimiseksi ehdotettiin hiljattain yhtenäistä Transformer-kehystä (T5), joka muuntaa kaikki kieliongelmat tekstiksi tekstiksi. Vaikka T5-mallista otettiin käyttöön myös monikielinen versio (mT5), ei ole selvää, miten hyvin se pärjää muissa kuin englanninkielisissä tehtävissä, joihin liittyy erilaisia tietoja. Tämän kysymyksen tutkimiseksi käytämme mT5:tä kielelle, jolla on laaja valikoima murteita - arabia. Arviointia varten esittelemme ARabic language GENERATION (ARGEN) -menetelmän, joka kattaa seitsemän tärkeää tehtävää. Mallivertailua varten esivalmennamme kolme tehokasta arabialaista T5-mallia ja arvioimme ne ARGENilla. Vaikka uudet mallit on koulutettu etukäteen noin 49 vähemmän dataa, ne suoriutuvat huomattavasti paremmin kuin mT5 kaikissa ARGEN-tehtävissä (52 testisarjaa 59:stä) ja asettivat useita uusia SOTAja. Mallimme luovat myös uuden SOTA:n vastikään ehdotetulle suurelle arabian kielen ymmärtämisen arviointivertailulle ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Uudet mallit ovat julkisesti saatavilla. Linkitämme myös ARGEN-aineistoihin arkistomme kautta: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'jv': 'Layaran kanggo kelas karo akeh Transformer sampeyan Nombo nek akeh langkung sampeyan versi sing model t5 kanggo kowé nggunakake kesempatan iki, kéné aplikasi mT 5 karo langkung karo akeh dilakot karo dialecto sing kalabu-arab. Ing deweke, kita enyester seneng nggawe barang kelompok kanggo ARapa luwih GENeration (ARGENE), nggawe sede nggawe barang nggawe Nyong ngomong model karo, kita lagi-siji telu maneh lan sampek layang arab-setlan lan nggawe barang ARGENO. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Rasané awakdhéwé éntuk sistem anyar soko soko soko nggawe barang sing luwih dumadhi, kuwi nggawe barang arap kuwi nggunakake bench-bench ARLUE (Abdul-Maked et al, 2020). model sing dibutuhke publik gawe Awak dhéwé mungkin kanggo ARGENdataset nang repdir dhéwé: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'sk': 'Pred kratkim smo predlagali prenosno učenje z enotnim transformatorskim okvirom (T5), ki vse jezikovne težave pretvori v obliko besedila v besedilo, kot preprost in učinkovit pristop prenosnega učenja. Čeprav je bila uvedena tudi večjezična različica modela T5 (mT5), ni jasno, kako dobro se lahko izvaja pri nalogah, ki niso angleška in vključujejo različne podatke. Za raziskovanje tega vprašanja uporabljamo mT5 na jeziku z različnimi narečji - arabsko. Za vrednotenje predstavljamo novo merilo za ARabično jezikovno generacijo (ARGEN), ki zajema sedem pomembnih nalog. Za primerjavo modelov predtreniramo tri močne arabske modele v slogu T5 in jih ocenimo na ARGEN. Čeprav so bili predhodno usposobljeni z ~49 manj podatkov, so naši novi modeli bistveno boljši od mT5 pri vseh nalogah ARGEN (v 52 od 59 testnih sklopov) in postavili več novih SOTA. Naši modeli vzpostavljajo tudi novo SOTA na nedavno predlaganem obsežnem merilu za ocenjevanje razumevanja arabskega jezika ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). Naši novi modeli so javno dostopni. S podatkovnimi nabori ARGEN se povezujemo tudi prek našega repozitorija: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'ha': "Transfer learning with a unified Transformer framework (T5) that converts all language problems into a text-to-text format was recently proposed as a simple and effective transfer learning approach.  Kuma kõ da aka introduce wani version na misalin T5 (mT5) na ƙara, ba ya bayyana yadda zai iya amfani da shi a kan aikin waɗanda bã-Ingiriya masu hususann data daban-daban. Yana amfani da mT5 a kan harshe-wasu -arabu. Ina iya ƙaddara, za mu iya ƙara wani bangon cikin harshen Arabi na GENER (AGEN), wanda ke rufe taskõki bakwai muhimmi. Misalin misali, za'a tafiyar da misãlai uku mai ƙarfi na arabu T5 kuma ka ƙaddara su a kan ANGEN. Ingawa an da aka yi wa zaman shirin da `49 ƙari da data, misalinmu na sami mafi alhẽri ko mT5 kan duk aikin AGEN (cikin 52 daga 59 tsaro) kuma ya daidaita wasu na SOTAs. Kamayõyinmu na samu'ar su sami SOTA a kan nan da aka buƙata, masu fahimtar maganar harshen Larabci na farko (Abdull-Maged et al., 2021). An sami misalinmu yanzu. Tuna sami haɗi da danne-AGEN cikin bakarãriyarmu: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.", 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་སྒྱུར་བ་ཞིག་གིས་སྤྱིར Although a multilingual version of the T5 model (mT5) was also introduced, it is not clear how well it can fare on non-English tasks involving various data. འདི་ལ་ང་ཚོས་རྐད་ཆ་ཞིག་གནད་སྡུད་མིན་འདུག་ལ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་། ARabic language GENeration དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན Although pre-trained with ~49 less data, our new models perform significantly better than mT5 on all ARGEN tasks (in 52 out of 59 test sets) and set several new SOTAs. Our models also establish new SOTA on the recently-proposed, large Arabic language understanding evaluation benchmark ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་གསར་བ་མང་ཆེས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ARGEN་གནད་སྡུད་མཛོད་ཁང་ཐོག་ནས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.', 'he': 'ההעברה של לימוד עם מסגרת מעברת מאוחדת (T5) שמהפכת את כל בעיות השפה לפורמט טקסט לטקסט הוצעה לאחרונה כגישה פשוט ויעילה ללמוד העברה. Although a multilingual version of the T5 model (mT5) was also introduced, it is not clear how well it can fare on non-English tasks involving diverse data.  כדי לחקור את השאלה הזאת, אנחנו משתמשים mT5 על שפה עם מגוון רחב של דיאלקטים - ערבי. למען הערכה, אנו מכירים רמז חדש לגנרציה של שפת אראבית (ARGEN), מכסה שבעה משימות חשובות. כדי להשוות דוגמנים, אנחנו מתאמנים לפני שלושה דוגמנים ערביים חזקים בסגנון T5 ולעריך אותם על ARGEN. Although pre-trained with ~49 less data, our new models perform significantly better than mT5 on all ARGEN tasks (in 52 out of 59 test sets) and set several new SOTAs.  הדוגמנים שלנו גם קובעים SOTA חדש על המרמז ההערכה הגדול של הבנה בשפה הערבית המוצע לאחרונה ARLUE (Abdul-Mageed et al., 2021). הדוגמנים החדשים שלנו זמינים לציבור. אנחנו גם מחוברים לקבוצות מידע ARGEN דרך המחסן שלנו: https://github.com/UBC-NLP/araT5.'}
{'en': 'Misinfo Reaction Frames: Reasoning about Readers’ Reactions to News Headlines', 'ar': 'توقع الحكم القانوني عبر استخراج الحدث مع القيود', 'pt': 'Previsão de julgamento legal por meio de extração de eventos com restrições', 'es': 'Predicción de sentencias legales mediante extracción de eventos con restricciones', 'fr': "Prédiction du jugement juridique via l'extraction d'événements avec contraintes", 'ru': 'Прогнозирование судебных решений посредством извлечения событий с ограничениями', 'ja': '制約付きイベント抽出による法的判断予測', 'zh': '以约束事取决占候', 'hi': 'बाधाओं के साथ घटना निष्कर्षण के माध्यम से कानूनी निर्णय भविष्यवाणी', 'ga': 'Réamh-mheastachán Breithiúnais Dlí trí Eastóscadh Imeachta le Srianta', 'hu': 'Jogi ítélet-előrejelzés esemény kivonásával, korlátozásokkal', 'el': 'Πρόβλεψη νομικής κρίσης μέσω εξαγωγής γεγονότων με περιορισμούς', 'ka': 'კონფიგურაციის გადაწყვეტი მოვლენების გამოყენებით', 'lt': 'Teisinio sprendimo numatymas ištraukiant įvykius su apribojimais', 'kk': 'Оқиға тарқату шектері арқылы оқиғаның шектері', 'it': 'Predizione del giudizio legale tramite estrazione di eventi con vincoli', 'mk': 'Предвидување на правната пресуда преку екстракција на настани со ограничувања', 'ms': 'Prediksi Hakim Hukum melalui Ekstraksi Peristiwa Dengan Hadangan', 'ml': 'കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റെന്\u200dറുകളോടൊപ്പം നിയമവിധിയുടെ മുന്\u200dഗണനം', 'mn': 'Хязгаарлалтайгаар үйл явдал гаргахад хууль шүүмжлэх төлөвлөгөө', 'mt': 'Tbassir ta’ Sentenza Legali permezz ta’ Estrazzjoni ta’ Avvenimenti b’Limitazzjonijiet', 'no': 'Legg avtale ved hendinga med begrensningar', 'pl': 'Prognoza orzeczeń prawnych poprzez ekstrakcję zdarzeń z ograniczeniami', 'ro': 'Predicția judecății judecătorești prin extragerea evenimentelor cu constrângeri', 'sr': 'Predviđanje pravnog suda putem izvlačenja događaja sa ograničenjima', 'si': 'නීතිය නිරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරධානය අවස්ථානය අවස්ථානය නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය', 'so': 'Ka hortagga xukunka sharciga ee ka soo bixinta dhaqdhaqaalaha', 'sv': 'Rättslig dom förutsägelse via händelseutvinning med begränsningar', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வு வெளியேறுதல் மூலம் சட்ட விதிவாதிப்பு முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'قانونی فیصلہ پیش بینی حادثہ اٹھانے کے ذریعہ', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Quyết định pháp lý qua sự tiết lộ với giới hạn', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на съдебно решение чрез извличане на събитие с ограничения', 'nl': 'Juridische oordeelvoorspelling via gebeurtenisextractie met beperkingen', 'da': 'Juridisk dom forudsigelse via hændelsesudtrækning med begrænsninger', 'hr': 'Predvidba pravnog suda putem izvlačenja događaja s ograničenjima', 'id': 'Prediksi Hakim Hukum melalui Ekstraksi Kejadian Dengan Kebatasan', 'ko': '구속 사건 추출에 기초한 법률 판결 예측', 'de': 'Rechtsprechung über Ereignisextraktion mit Einschränkungen', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد قضاوت قانونی از طریق اخراج اتفاق با محدودیت', 'tr': 'Ýabşyrlamak bilen Hudaly Çikleme Wasp', 'af': 'Regtige oordeel voorvloediging deur gebeurtenis uitpak met beheinings', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Sheria kupitia Utoa wa Matukio na Mashitaka', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i gjykimit ligjor nëpërmjet ekstrahimit të ngjarjeve me kufizime', 'am': 'የሕግ ፍርድ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Օրինակական դատաստանի կանխատեսումը իրադարձությունների հանման միջոցով սահմանափակումներով', 'az': '凉饲捬즙湤楲楬즙渠噡煩祹즙琠쎇쒱燄뇅鿄넠癡獩瓉饳楬즙⁈慱焠奡牧쒱污浡⁐牥摩捴楯渊', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষকদের সাথে ইভেন্ট এক্সট্র্যাকশনের মাধ্যমে আইন বিচার প্রেকশন', 'cs': 'Předpověď právního rozsudku prostřednictvím extrakce událostí s omezeními', 'et': 'Õigusliku kohtuotsuse prognoosimine sündmuste väljavõtmise kaudu piirangutega', 'bs': 'Predviđanje pravnog suda putem izvlačenja događaja s ograničenjima', 'ca': "Predicció del judici legal a través de l'extracció d'eventos amb restriccions", 'fi': 'Oikeudellisen tuomion ennustaminen tapahtumapurkamisen ja rajoitusten avulla', 'jv': 'Perusahaan hukum sing dibenalke Kemerdekaan Winter', 'sk': 'Napoved pravne sodbe prek odvzema dogodkov z omejitvami', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཚད་འཛིན་བྱས་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤས་ཆེན་བྱེད་པ', 'he': 'צפוי שיפוט משפטי באמצעות חיתוך אירועים עם מגבלות'}
{'en': 'Even to a simple and short news headline, readers react in a multitude of ways: cognitively (e.g. inferring the writer’s intent), emotionally (e.g. feeling distrust), and behaviorally (e.g. sharing the news with their friends). Such reactions are instantaneous and yet complex, as they rely on factors that go beyond interpreting factual content of news.We propose Misinfo Reaction Frames (MRF), a pragmatic formalism for modeling how readers might react to a news headline. In contrast to categorical schema, our free-text dimensions provide a more nuanced way of understanding intent beyond being benign or malicious. We also introduce a Misinfo Reaction Frames corpus, a crowdsourced dataset of reactions to over 25k news headlines focusing on global crises: the Covid-19 pandemic, climate change, and cancer. Empirical results confirm that it is indeed possible for neural models to predict the prominent patterns of readers’ reactions to previously unseen news headlines. Additionally, our user study shows that displaying machine-generated MRF implications alongside news headlines to readers can increase their trust in real news while decreasing their trust in misinformation. Our work demonstrates the feasibility and importance of pragmatic inferences on news headlines to help enhance AI-guided misinformation detection and mitigation.', 'ar': 'في حين تم إحراز تقدم كبير في مهمة التنبؤ بالحكم القانوني (LJP) في السنوات الأخيرة ، يمكن أن تُعزى التنبؤات غير الصحيحة التي قدمتها نماذج SOTA LJP جزئيًا إلى فشلهم في (1) تحديد معلومات الحدث الرئيسي التي تحدد الحكم ، و (2) استغلال قيود تناسق المهام المتقاطعة الموجودة بين المهام الفرعية لـ LJP. لمعالجة نقاط الضعف هذه ، نقترح EPM ، نموذج تنبؤ قائم على الأحداث مع قيود ، والذي يتجاوز نماذج SOTA الحالية في الأداء على مجموعة بيانات LJP قياسية.', 'es': 'Si bien se han logrado avances significativos en la tarea de Predicción de Sentencias Legales (LJP) en los últimos años, las predicciones incorrectas realizadas por los modelos SOTA LJP pueden atribuirse en parte a su incapacidad para (1) localizar la información clave del evento que determina el juicio y (2) aprovechar la coherencia entre tareas. restricciones que existen entre las subtareas de LJP. Para abordar estas debilidades, proponemos EPM, un modelo de predicción basado en eventos con restricciones, que supera a los modelos SOTA existentes en rendimiento en un conjunto de datos LJP estándar.', 'fr': "Bien que des progrès significatifs aient été réalisés sur la tâche de prédiction du jugement juridique (LJP) au cours des dernières années, les prévisions incorrectes faites par les modèles SOTA LJP peuvent être attribuées en partie à leur incapacité à (1) localiser les informations d'événement clé qui déterminent le jugement, et (2) à exploiter la cohérence entre les tâches contraintes qui existent parmi les sous-tâches de LJP. Pour remédier à ces faiblesses, nous proposons EPM, un modèle de prédiction basé sur les événements avec contraintes, qui surpasse les modèles SOTA existants en termes de performances sur un ensemble de données LJP standard.", 'pt': 'Embora um progresso significativo tenha sido feito na tarefa de Previsão de Julgamento Judicial (LJP) nos últimos anos, as previsões incorretas feitas pelos modelos SOTA LJP podem ser atribuídas em parte à sua falha em (1) localizar as principais informações do evento que determinam o julgamento, e (2) explorar as restrições de consistência entre tarefas que existem entre as subtarefas do LJP. Para resolver esses pontos fracos, propomos o EPM, um modelo de previsão baseado em eventos com restrições, que supera os modelos SOTA existentes em desempenho em um conjunto de dados LJP padrão.', 'ja': '近年、法的判断予測（ Legal Judgment Prediction, LJP ）のタスクで大きな進展が見られたが、SOTA LJPモデルが行った誤った予測は、(1)判断を決定する重要なイベント情報を特定できなかったこと、(2) LJPのサブタスク間に存在するクロスタスク整合性制約を利用できなかったことが一因である。これらの弱点に対処するために、私たちはEPMを提案します。これは制約のあるイベントベースの予測モデルで、標準的なLJPデータセットのパフォーマンスで既存のSOTAモデルを上回ります。', 'zh': '虽近岁断法(LJP)取重大进展于法,而SOTA LJP形之失疑归因于其未(1)定位决机,及(2)用LJP子之跨务一致性约束。 为此等弱,吾等发EPM,此乃事之占,有约束,于准LJP数集上过于今SOTA。', 'ru': 'Хотя в последние годы был достигнут значительный прогресс в выполнении задачи прогнозирования судебных решений (LJP), неправильные прогнозы, сделанные моделями SOTA LJP, могут быть отчасти объяснены их неспособностью (1) найти ключевую информацию о событиях, которая определяет решение, и (2) использовать ограничения согласованности перекрестных задач, которые существуют среди подзадач LJP. Для устранения этих слабых мест мы предлагаем EPM, основанную на событиях модель прогнозирования с ограничениями, которая превосходит существующие модели SOTA по производительности на стандартном наборе данных LJP.', 'hi': 'जबकि हाल के वर्षों में कानूनी निर्णय भविष्यवाणी (एलजेपी) के कार्य पर महत्वपूर्ण प्रगति हुई है, सोटा एलजेपी मॉडल द्वारा की गई गलत भविष्यवाणियों को उनकी विफलता के लिए जिम्मेदार ठहराया जा सकता है (1) निर्णय निर्धारित करने वाली प्रमुख घटना जानकारी का पता लगाने के लिए, और (2) एलजेपी के उप-कार्यों के बीच मौजूद क्रॉस-टास्क स्थिरता बाधाओं का फायदा उठाना। इन कमजोरियों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम ईपीएम, बाधाओं के साथ एक ईवेंट-आधारित भविष्यवाणी मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक मानक एलजेपी डेटासेट पर प्रदर्शन में मौजूदा SOTA मॉडल को पार करता है।', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil dul chun cinn suntasach déanta ar thasc na Réamhthuar Breithiúnais Dlí (LJP) le blianta beaga anuas, is féidir na réamh-mheastacháin mhíchearta a rinne samhlacha SOTA LJP a chur i leith go páirteach as a dteip (1) an fhaisnéis príomhtheagmhais a chinneann an breithiúnas a aimsiú, i.e. agus (2) leas a bhaint as na srianta comhsheasmhachta tras-tasc atá ann i measc fhothascanna an LJP. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na laigí seo, molaimid EPM, Samhail Tuartha Imeachta-bhunaithe le srianta, a sháraíonn na samhlacha SOTA atá ann cheana i bhfeidhmíocht ar thacar sonraí caighdeánach LJP.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი შეიძლება შემდეგ წინ წინ წინ წინ გადაწყვეტილების (LJP) პარამეტრებში, როცა SOTA LJP მოდელების შეცდომა წინაწყვეტილება შეიძლება ატრიბუტირება, რომელიც გადაწყვეტილებას განსაზღვრას გასაკეთებელი მოვლენის ინფორმაციას (1) დააღმოჩენ ჩვენ EPM-ს, მოვლენების დასაბამისი მოდექციის მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო უფრო მუშაობს SOTA მოდელების გამოყენებაში, სტანდარტული LJP მონაცემების შესაბამისთვის.', 'hu': 'Bár az elmúlt években jelentős előrelépés történt a Jogi Ítélet-előrejelzés (LJP) feladatában, a SOTA LJP modellek által tett helytelen előrejelzések részben annak tulajdoníthatók, hogy (1) nem találták meg az ítéletet meghatározó kulcsfontosságú eseményinformációkat, és (2) nem használták ki az LJP alcsoportjai között fennálló kölcsönös feladatkövetkezetességi korlátokat. Ezeknek a hiányosságoknak a kezelésére javasoljuk az EPM-et, egy eseményalapú előrejelzési modellt, amely meghaladja a meglévő SOTA modelleket egy standard LJP adatkészleten.', 'el': 'Ενώ έχει σημειωθεί σημαντική πρόοδος όσον αφορά το έργο της πρόβλεψης νομικών κρίσεων (LJP) τα τελευταία χρόνια, οι λανθασμένες προβλέψεις που έγιναν από τα μοντέλα SOTA LJP μπορούν να αποδοθούν εν μέρει στην αποτυχία τους (1) να εντοπίσουν τις βασικές πληροφορίες συμβάντος που καθορίζουν την κρίση και (2) να εκμεταλλευτούν τους περιορισμούς συνοχής μεταξύ των επιμέρους εργασιών του LJP. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτές οι αδυναμίες, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο πρόβλεψης βασισμένο σε συμβάντα με περιορισμούς, το οποίο ξεπερνά τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα SOTA σε απόδοση σε ένα τυποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων LJP.', 'it': 'Mentre negli ultimi anni sono stati compiuti progressi significativi sul compito della previsione del giudizio legale (LJP), le previsioni errate fatte dai modelli SOTA LJP possono essere attribuite in parte alla loro incapacità di (1) individuare le informazioni chiave sugli eventi che determinano il giudizio e (2) sfruttare i vincoli di coerenza cross-task esistenti tra le sottoattività di LJP. Per affrontare queste debolezze, proponiamo EPM, un modello di previsione basato su eventi con vincoli, che supera i modelli SOTA esistenti in termini di prestazioni su un set di dati LJP standard.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдарда SOTA LJP үлгілерінің тапсырмасының (LJP) тапсырмасында маңызды жұмыс істегенде, SOTA LJP үлгілерінің жарамсыз тапсырмаларын (1) анықтайтын кілт оқиға мәліметін табуға болады, және (2) LJP ішкі тапсырмалардың ортасындағы көп тапсырмалардың тұра Бұл зақымдарды өзгерту үшін біз EPM дегенді, оқиға негіздеген Prediction үлгісін шектеу үлгісін қолданамыз. Бұл барлық SOTA үлгілерін стандартты LJP деректер жиынында орындалатын.', 'lt': 'While significant progress has been made on the task of Legal Judgment Prediction (LJP) in recent years, the incorrect predictions made by SOTA LJP models can be attributed in part to their failure to (1) locate the key event information that determines the judgment, and (2) exploit the cross-task consistency constraints that exist among the subtasks of LJP.  Siekiant pašalinti šiuos trūkumus, siūlome EPM, įvykiais pagrįsto prognozavimo modelį su apribojimais, kuris viršija esamus SOTA modelius, veikiančius standartiniame LJP duomenų rinkinyje.', 'mk': 'Иако во последниве години е постигнат значителен напредок во врска со задачата на Предвидувањето на правната судбина (ЛЈП), погрешните предвидувања направени од моделите на СОТА ЛЈП може делумно да се припишат на нивното неуспех (1) да се лоцираат клучните информации за настаните кои ја одредуваат судбината и (2) да се искористат ограничувањата на константноста на крстозадачите кои пост За да ги решиме овие слабости, ние предлагаме ЕПМ, модел на предвидување базиран на настани со ограничувања, кој ги надминува постојните модели на СОТА во изведба на стандарден податок на ЛЈП.', 'ms': 'Walaupun kemajuan yang signifikan telah dilakukan pada tugas Penyataan Hakim Hukum (LJP) dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, ramalan yang salah dilakukan oleh model LJP SOTA boleh dianggap sebahagian daripada kegagalan mereka untuk (1) mencari maklumat peristiwa utama yang menentukan penghakiman, dan (2) mengeksploitasikan batasan konsistensi tugas-salib yang wujud di antara sub-tanya LJP. Untuk mengatasi kelemahan ini, kami cadangkan EPM, Model Prediksi Berasas Kejadian dengan keterangan, yang melebihi model SOTA yang wujud dalam prestasi pada set data LJP piawai.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d നിയമവിധിയുടെ (LJP) ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രവർത്തിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രവർത്തികമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തിയിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, SOTA LJP മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ തെറ്റായ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഗമായി പ്രാവര്\u200dത് ഈ ദുര്\u200dബല്യങ്ങളെ സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എപിഎം പ്രിസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു, സാധാരണ LJP ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള SOTA മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പ', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li sar progress sinifikanti fil-kompitu tat-Tbassir tas-Sentenza Legali (LJP) f’dawn l-aħħar snin, it-tbassir mhux korrett magħmul mill-mudelli tas-SOTA LJP jista’ jiġi attribwit parzjalment għan-nuqqas tagħhom li (1) jinstabu l-informazzjoni ewlenija dwar l-avveniment li tiddetermina s-sentenza, u (2) jisfruttaw ir-restrizzjonijiet ta’ konsistenza bejn ix-xogħlijiet li jeżistu fost is-sottomistoqsijiet tal-LJP. To address these weaknesses, we propose EPM, an Event-based Prediction Model with constraints, which surpasses existing SOTA models in performance on a standard LJP dataset.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд хуулийн Шүүмжлэх Эмчилгээ (LJP) даалгаврын тухай маш чухал хөгжлийн даалгавар гарч ирсэн ч SOTA LJP загварын буруу таамаглал (1) болон шүүмжлэг тодорхойлж чадахгүй (2) тодорхойлж чадах чухал үйл явдал мэдээллийг олж мэднэ. Эдгээр сул байдлыг зохицуулахын тулд бид EPM-г зөвшөөрөх боломжтой Хязгаарлалтын төлөвлөгөөний загвар, стандарт LJP өгөгдлийн суурь дээр суурилсан SOTA загваруудыг илүү өндөртэй.', 'pl': 'Chociaż w ostatnich latach poczyniono znaczące postępy w zakresie prognozowania orzeczeń prawnych (LJP), nieprawidłowe prognozy dokonane przez modele SOTA LJP można częściowo przypisać ich niezdolności do (1) zlokalizowania kluczowych informacji o zdarzeniu, które decydują o wyroku, oraz (2) wykorzystania ograniczeń spójności między zadaniami, które istnieją wśród podzadań LJP. Aby rozwiązać te słabości, proponujemy EPM, model predykcyjny oparty na zdarzeniach z ograniczeniami, który przewyższa istniejące modele SOTA pod względem wydajności standardowego zbioru danych LJP.', 'sr': 'Iako je u poslednjih godina ostvaren značajan napredak na zadatku predviđanja pravnog suda (LJP), nepravde predviđanja koje su napravili modeli SOTA LJP-a mogu biti pripisana na njihov neuspjeh (1) da pronađu ključnu informaciju o događajima koja određuje presudu, i (2) iskorištavaju ograničenja konsekvencije prekršaja koja postoje među podstavama LJP-a. Da bi se riješili ovim slabostima, predlažemo EPM, model predviđanja na osnovu događaja sa ograničenjima, koji prelazi postojećim SOTA modelima u izvođenju na standardnom setu podataka LJP-a.', 'ro': 'Deși s-au înregistrat progrese semnificative în ceea ce privește sarcina Predicției Judecății Juridice (LJP) în ultimii ani, previziunile incorecte făcute de modelele SOTA LJP pot fi atribuite în parte incapacității acestora de a (1) localiza informațiile cheie despre evenimente care determină hotărârea și (2) de a exploata constrângerile de coerență între sarcini care există printre subactivitățile LJP. Pentru a aborda aceste puncte slabe, propunem EPM, un Model de Predicție bazat pe evenimente cu constrângeri, care depășește modelele SOTA existente în performanță pe un set de date standard LJP.', 'no': 'Mens det er gjort viktig framgang på oppgåva av rettsprøytebruk (LJP) i løpet av siste år, kan dei feil foregåva som er gjort av SOTA LJP-modeller delvis bli tilgjengelege til å finna nøkkelhendingsinformasjonen som bestemmer sprøytebruken, og (2) bruka grensene for krusteoppgåver som finst mellom underspørsmålene av LJP. For å handtere desse tyrkene, foreslår vi EPM, eit hendingsbasert forhåndsvisningsmodell med begrensningar, som overpassar eksisterande SOTA-modeller i utføring på ein standard LJP-datasett.', 'sv': 'Även om betydande framsteg har gjorts när det gäller uppgiften för rättslig bedömning (LJP) under de senaste åren, kan de felaktiga förutsägelser som gjorts av SOTA LJP-modeller delvis tillskrivas att de inte (1) lokaliserar den viktigaste händelseinformation som avgör domen, och (2) utnyttjar de begränsningar av konsekvens mellan olika uppgifter som finns bland LJP:s underuppgifter. För att åtgärda dessa svagheter föreslår vi EPM, en händelsebaserad förutsägelsemodell med begränsningar, som överträffar befintliga SOTA-modeller i prestanda på en standard LJP datauppsättning.', 'si': 'මෙහෙම විශේෂ ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නීතිය ප්\u200dරධානය (LJP) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන්, SOTA LJP මොඩලයෙන් කරපු වැරදි ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධා අපි මේ දුර්වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, EPM එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, සිද්ධ විශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් LJP දත්ත සැට වල ඉ', 'ta': 'சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் சட்ட தீர்ப்பு முன்னேற்றம் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது இந்த பலஹீனங்களை விளக்க, நாம் EPM, ஒரு நிகழ்வு அடிப்படையான முன்னேற்றம் மாதிரி மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் SOTA மாதிர', 'so': 'While significant progress has been made on the task of Legal Judgment Prediction (LJP) in recent years, the incorrect predictions made by SOTA LJP models can be attributed in part to their failure to (1) locate the key event information that determines the judgment, and (2) exploit the cross-task consistency constraints that exist among the subtasks of LJP.  Si a an ugu hadlno tabaryaradaas, waxaan soo jeedaynaa EPM, taas oo ah Model qaynuunno ku saleysan dhacdooyinka, kaas oo ku qoran sameynta sameynta samooyinka SOTA oo ku qoran danbiyada caadiga ah ee LJP.', 'ur': 'حالانکہ اگلے سالوں میں قانونی فیصلہ کی پیشنهاد (LJP) کے کام پر اہم اضافہ کی گئی ہے، سوٹا LJP موڈل کے ذریعہ سے غلطی پیشنهادیں ان کی غلطی کے بارے میں (1) کو پہنچا سکتی ہیں جو فیصلہ کا فیصلہ کرتا ہے، اور (2) کرس-ٹاکس کی تعلطی کے محدودیت کو استعمال کرتا ہے جو LJP کے نیچے محدودیت میں موجود ہیں. ان کمزوریوں کے بارے میں ہم EPM کی پیشنهاد کریں گے، ایک ایڈینٹ بنیاد کی پیشنهاد موڈل کی محدودیت کے ساتھ، جو ایک استاندارد LJP ڈیٹ سٹ پر موجود SOTA موڈل سے زیادہ گزر جاتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Yaqinda SOTA LJP modellari yaratilgan notoʻgʻri taʼminlovchi narsalar (LJP) vazifani aniqlash muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi va LJP vazifalarida mavjud boʻlgan vazifalarni ishlatish mumkin. Bu kasalliklarni talab qilish uchun biz EPM, hodisa asosidagi Prediction Model bilan murakkab qilamiz. Bu holatda mavjud SOTA modellarini andoza LJP maʼlumot tizimini bajarishga moslash mumkin.', 'vi': 'Mặc dù trong những năm gần đây đã có tiến bộ đáng kể về nhiệm vụ định hạn phán quyết pháp (LJP) nhưng dự đoán sai của SOTA LJP có thể được cho là đôi khi chúng không xác định vị trí các thông tin quan trọng quyết định sự kiện quyết định quyết định quyết định quyết định quyết định quyết định quyết định quyết định, và (2) tận dụng những giới hạn liên quan giữa các chi tiết của LJP. Để giải quyết những yếu điểm này, chúng tôi đề nghị EPM, một mô hình dự đoán dựa vào sự kiện có hạn chế, mà vượt qua các mô hình SOE còn sót trong các trình phục vụ trên một bộ dữ liệu mẫu LJP tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че през последните години е постигнат значителен напредък по задачата за прогнозиране на съдебните решения, неправилните прогнози, направени от моделите SOTA LJP, могат отчасти да бъдат приписани на неспособността им (1) да намерят ключовата информация за събитията, която определя решението, и (2) да експлоатират ограниченията за съгласуваност между задачите, които съществуват сред подзадачите на LJP. За да се справим с тези слабости, предлагаме модел за прогнозиране въз основа на събития с ограничения, който надминава съществуващите модели по производителност на стандартен набор от данни.', 'da': "Selv om der i de seneste år er sket betydelige fremskridt med hensyn til opgaven med Juridisk Judgment Prediction (LJP), kan de ukorrekte forudsigelser fra SOTA LJP-modeller til dels tilskrives, at de ikke (1) har fundet de vigtigste begivenhedsoplysninger, der bestemmer dommen, og (2) udnytte de tværfaglige konsistensbegrænsninger, der findes blandt LJP's underopgaver. For at afhjælpe disse svagheder foreslår vi EPM, en begivenhedsbaseret forudsigelsesmodel med begrænsninger, som overgår eksisterende SOTA-modeller i ydeevne på et standard LJP datasæt.", 'nl': 'Hoewel er in de afgelopen jaren aanzienlijke vooruitgang is geboekt met de taak van Legal Judgment Prediction (LJP), kunnen de onjuiste voorspellingen van SOTA LJP-modellen gedeeltelijk worden toegeschreven aan het feit dat zij (1) de belangrijkste gebeurtenisinformatie die het oordeel bepaalt, niet hebben kunnen lokaliseren en (2) de cross-task consistentie beperkingen benutten die bestaan tussen de subtaken van LJP. Om deze zwakke punten aan te pakken, stellen we EPM voor, een Event-based Prediction Model met beperkingen, dat bestaande SOTA modellen overtreft in prestaties op een standaard LJP dataset.', 'id': 'Sementara kemajuan yang signifikan telah dilakukan dalam tugas Pengadilan Hukum (LJP) dalam tahun-tahun terakhir, prediksi yang salah yang dilakukan oleh model LJP SOTA dapat dianggap sebagian dari gagal mereka untuk (1) menemukan informasi peristiwa kunci yang menentukan penghakiman, dan (2) mengeksploitasi batas konsistensi tugas salib yang ada di antara subtasks LJP. Untuk mengatasi kelemahan ini, kami mengusulkan EPM, Model Prediksi Berdasarkan Kejadian dengan batas, yang melebihi model SOTA yang ada dalam prestasi pada set data standar LJP.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 법적 판단 예측(LJP) 임무에 큰 진전을 거두었지만, SOTA LJP 모델의 잘못된 예측 부분은 그들이 판단을 결정하는 관건적인 사건 정보를 찾지 못했기 때문이며, LJP 하위 임무 사이에 존재하는 크로스 임무 일치성 제약을 이용하지 못했기 때문이다.이러한 단점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 이벤트에 기반한 제약이 있는 예측 모델인 EPM을 제시했는데 이것은 표준 LJP 데이터 집합에서 기존의 SOTA 모델을 능가한다.', 'hr': 'Iako je u posljednjih godina ostvaren značajan napredak na zadatku predviđanja pravnog suda (LJP), nepravedne predviđanja koje su napravili modeli SOTA LJP-a mogu biti pripisane dio njihovog neuspjeha (1) locirati ključne informacije o događajima koji određuju sudbinu, te (2) iskoristiti ograničenje konsekvencije prekršaja koja postoje među podstavama LJP-a. Da bi se riješili ovim slabostima, predlažemo EPM, model predviđanja na temelju događaja s ograničenjima, koji prelazi postojeće SOTA modele u provedbi na standardnom setu podataka LJP-a.', 'de': 'Während bei der Aufgabe der Legal Judgment Prediction (LJP) in den letzten Jahren erhebliche Fortschritte erzielt wurden, können die falschen Vorhersagen von SOTA LJP Modellen zum Teil darauf zurückzuführen sein, dass sie (1) die wichtigsten Ereignisinformationen, die das Urteil bestimmen, nicht lokalisieren und (2) die aufgabenübergreifenden Konsistenzbeschränkungen ausnutzen konnten, die unter den Teilaufgaben von LJP existieren. Um diese Schwachstellen zu beheben, schlagen wir EPM vor, ein ereignisbasiertes Vorhersagemodell mit Einschränkungen, das bestehende SOTA-Modelle in Bezug auf die Leistung eines Standard-LJP-Datensatzes übertrifft.', 'af': "Alhoewel betekende vordering is gemaak op die taak van Regtige oordeel voorskou (LJP) in onlangse jaar, kan die verkeerde voorskou wat deur SOTA LJP modele gemaak is, in deel aan hul mislukking om (1) die sleutel gebeurtenis inligting te vind wat die oordeel bepaal, en (2) die kruis-taak konsistensiehouers wat bestaan onder die subtaske van LJP. Om hierdie swakhede te adres, voorstel ons EPM, 'n Begeefde-gebaseerde voorskrifte-model met beheininge, wat oorgaan bestaande SOTA-modele in uitvoering op 'n standaard LJP-datastel.", 'fa': 'در حالی که در سال های اخیر پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای قانونی (LJP) پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای غلط توسط مدل\u200cهای SOTA LJP، پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای غلطی که توسط مدل\u200cهای SOTA LJP انجام داده\u200cاند، بخشی از شکست\u200cهایشان به (1) اطلاعات کلیدی رویداد را که تصمیم دادن قضاوت را تعیین می\u200cکند، و (2) محدودیت\u200cهای هماهنگی\u200cکننده\u200cای که در می برای حل این ضعیفی، ما EPM را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک مدل پیشنهاد بر اساس رویداد با محدودیت، که مدل\u200cهای SOTA موجود در انجام روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای LJP استاندارد از حد گذشته است.', 'tr': "Soňky ýyllar içinde Ulusal Haýsy Prediksiýasy (LJP) täsirinde wajyp ilerlemesi bolup geçdi. SOTA LJP modelleri tarapyndan ýalňyş önlemeler (1) hökmü berýän açyk wajyp maglumatyny ýerleşdirip biler, we (2) LJP subtasklarynyň içinde bar cross-task durmuşy mümkin edýär Bu zaçyrlyklara çözmek üçin, EPM'i, taýdan tabanly bir Prediksiýa Modeli çyzgylyklar bilen üýtgedýäris. Bu SOTA nusgalaryny standart LJP datawatlarynda etmäge üstün edýär.", 'sw': 'Wakati maendeleo makubwa yamefanyika katika kazi ya Udhibiti wa Sheria (LJP) katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, utabiri usio sahihi uliofanywa na Mradi wa SOTA LJP unaweza kuwepo sehemu ya kushindwa kutafuta taarifa za tukio muhimu zinazohitimisha hukumu, na (2) kutumia vikwazo vikwazo vinavyofanana na kazi za kupitia mipango ambayo yanakuwepo miongoni mwa kazi za LJP. Ili kuzungumzia udhaifu huu, tunapendekeza Waziri Mkuu wa EPM, Mradi wa Udhibiti anayeishi matukio yenye vikwazo, ambacho kinapitisha mifano ya SOTA yanayopo kwenye utendaji wa takwimu za LJP za kiwango cha kawaida.', 'sq': "Ndërsa përparimi i rëndësishëm është bërë në detyrën e parashikimit të gjykimit ligjor (LJP) në vitet e fundit, parashikimet e gabuara të bërë nga modelet SOTA LJP mund të atribuohen pjesërisht në dështimin e tyre në (1) gjetjen e informacionit kryesor të ngjarjes që përcakton gjykimin dhe (2) shfrytëzimin e kufizimeve të konsistencës ndër detyrat që ekzistojnë midis nëndetyrave të LJP. Për t'i trajtuar këto dobësi, ne propozojmë EPM, një model parashikimi me bazë në ngjarje me kufizime, i cili tejkalon modelet ekzistuese të SOTA në shfaqje në një sistem të dhënash standard LJP.", 'az': "Son illərdə Yaxşı hökm Prediction (LJP) işində möhkəm tədbir edilmiş halda, SOTA LJP modellərinin yanlış tədbir edilmiş tədbirlərin bir hissəsi olaraq (1) hökmünü müəyyən edən anahtar olaraq məlumatlarını yerinə yetirə bilər və (2) LJP subtasklarının arasında olan çətinlikli tədbirləri istifadə edə bilər. Bu zəifliklərdən çəkinmək üçün EPM'i təbliğ edirik, olaraq-tabanlı təbliğ Modeli, standart LJP verilənlərin quruluğunda esoqları SOTA modellərindən üstün edir.", 'bs': 'Iako je u posljednjih godina ostvaren značajan napredak na zadatku predviđanja pravnog suda (LJP), nepravde predviđanja koje su izvedene modelima SOTA LJP-a mogu biti pripisana na njihov neuspjeh (1) da pronađu ključnu informaciju o događajima koja određuje presudu, i (2) iskorištavaju ograničenja konsekvencije prekršaja koja postoje među podstavama LJP-a. Da bi se riješili ovim slabostima, predlažemo EPM, model predviđanja na osnovu događaja s ograničenjima, koji prelazi postojećim SOTA modelima u provedbi na standardnom setu podataka LJP-a.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ዓመታት ውስጥ የሕግ ፍርድ አካባቢ (LJP) ስራ ላይ የተደረገ ግንኙነት ሲሆን፣ የSOTA LJP ዓይነቶች የተደረገውን የስህተት ትንቢት በክፍል በመጠቀም ይችላል (1) ፍርድን በሚያረጋግጥ የቁልፍ ጉዳይ መረጃ ማግኘት እና (2) ከLJP ስራቶች መካከል ያለውን የሥልጣን ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ግንኙነት በመጠቀም ይችላል። እነዚህን ድካሞች ለመቀበል፣ የሁኔታ ላይ የተመሠረተውን የፕሮግራም ሞዴል፣ የSOTA ሞዴላዎችን በተቃውሞ LJP ዳታተር ማድረጊያውን ለመጠቀም እናስጀጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ վերջին տարիների ընթացքում կարևոր առաջընթաց է կատարվել իրավաբանական դատողության կանխատեսման (LJP) խնդրի վրա, սխալ կանխատեսումները, որ կատարվել են SOta LJP մոդելների կողմից, կարող են մասամբ պատասխանվել նրանց ձախողվելուն (1) գտնելու կարևոր իրադարձությունների տեղեկատվությունը, որը որոշում է դատողությունը, և (2) օգտագործելու LJP ենթախնդիրների Այս թույլությունները լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք EpM-ը, իրադարձությունների վրա հիմնված կանխատեսման մոդելը, որն ունի սահմանափակումներ, որը գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող SOta-մոդելները, երբ արտադրվում է ստանդարտ LJP տվյալների համակար', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে আইন বিচার প্রেসিডেন্ট (এলজেপি) কাজের উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অগ্রগতি তৈরি করা হয়েছে, এসওটা এলজেপি মডেলের ভুল ভবিষ্যৎবাণী তাদের ব্যর্থ হয়েছে (১) বিচারের সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণের মূল এই দুর্বলতা নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা ইপিএমিটির প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি একটি ইভেন্ট ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক প্রেসিডেশন মডেল, যা স্ট্যান্ডার্ড এলজেপি ডাটাসেট', 'ca': "Malgrat que s'ha aconseguit progrés significatius en la tasca de la Predicció Jurídica (LJP) en els últims anys, les prediccions incorrectes fetes pels models SOTA LJP poden ser atribuïdes en part al seu fracàs de (1) localitzar la informació clau sobre l'evento que determina el judici, i (2) explotar les restriccions de consistencia entre les tasques cruzades que existeixen entre les subtaskes de LJP. To address these weaknesses, we propose EPM, an Event-based Prediction Model with constraints, which surpasses existing SOTA models in performance on a standard LJP dataset.", 'cs': 'Zatímco v posledních letech bylo dosaženo významného pokroku v oblasti předpovědi právního rozsudku (LJP), nesprávné předpovědi modelů SOTA LJP lze částečně přičíst jejich neschopnosti (1) nalézt klíčové informace o událostech, které určují rozsudek, a (2) využít omezení konzistence mezi úkoly, která existují mezi dílúkoly LJP. Pro řešení těchto slabých stránek navrhujeme EPM, událostně založený predikční model s omezeními, který překonává existující SOTA modely ve výkonu na standardní LJP datové sadě.', 'et': 'Kuigi viimastel aastatel on tehtud märkimisväärseid edusamme õiguslike kohtuotsuste prognoosimise ülesandes, võib SOTA LJP mudelite ebaõigeid prognoose osaliselt seostada sellega, et need ei suutnud (1) leida otsust määravat olulist sündmuste teavet ja (2) kasutada ära LJP alamülesannete hulgas esinevaid ülesannetevahelise järjepidevuse piiranguid. Nende puuduste kõrvaldamiseks pakume välja EPM, piirangutega sündmuspõhine prognoosimismudel, mis ületab olemasolevaid SOTA mudeleid standardse LJP andmekogumi jõudluse poolest.', 'fi': 'Vaikka oikeudellisten tuomioiden ennakoinnin (Legal Judgment Prediction, LJP) tehtävässä on viime vuosina edistytty merkittävästi, SOTA LJP -mallien virheellisten ennusteiden voidaan katsoa osittain johtuvan siitä, ettei niissä ole (1) löydetty tuomiota määrittäviä keskeisiä tapahtumatietoja ja (2) hyödynnetty LJP:n alitehtävissä esiintyviä tehtävien välistä johdonmukaisuutta koskevia rajoituksia. Näiden heikkouksien korjaamiseksi ehdotamme EPM:tä, tapahtumapohjaista ennustemallia, jolla on rajoituksia, joka ylittää nykyiset SOTA-mallit standardissa LJP-aineistossa.', 'jv': "Alpha Ditawak dhéwé nggambar weakness iki, kita ngobudhakan PPM, model prediksiyon sing basa gambar n'ar aturan sing bisa nguasakno, dadi wis mulasar model sing misil nang atawa iki bakal terus nyimpen dataset Ljp awak dhéwé.", 'ha': "Alhãli kuwa an sami mafariko mai girma a kan aikin Legal Domainment (LJP) a cikin shekara na farko, watau misãlai wanda aka aikata na SOTA LJP, za'a iya ƙayyade shi rabo da rabo zuwa (1) ya gane information ga maɓallin halin da ke hukunta hukuncin, kuma (2) ya yi amfani da kandamta ta mai daidaita wa-aikin da ke cikin buƙatan aikin LJP. Domin ka yi magana ga maras wannan rauni, Muke buƙata wata Model Prediction a kan Gani-Gani, da kuma ana sami misãlai da SOTA wanda ke gaba a kan cikakken danne na LJP na daidaita.", 'sk': 'Čeprav je bil v zadnjih letih dosežen znaten napredek pri nalogi napovedovanja pravnih sodb (LJP), je mogoče napačne napovedi modelov SOTA LJP deloma pripisati temu, da niso (1) našli ključnih informacij o dogodkih, ki določajo sodbo, in (2) izkoristili omejitev mednalog skladnosti, ki obstajajo med podnalogami LJP. Za odpravo teh pomanjkljivosti predlagamo EPM, model napovedovanja dogodkov z omejitvami, ki presega obstoječe modele SOTA glede zmogljivosti standardnega nabora podatkov LJP.', 'he': 'למרות שהתקדמות משמעותית נעשתה במשימה של שיפוט משפטי (LJP) בשנים האחרונות, התחזויות הלא נכונות שעשויות על ידי דוגמנים של SOTA LJP יכולות להיות מחויבות חלקית לכישלותם לאתר (1) מידע האירוע המפתח שמקבע את השיפוט, ו (2) לנצל את חובלות התקבילות המשימה הצלבית שקיים בין התשובות של LJP. כדי להתמודד עם החולשות האלה, אנו מציעים EPM, מודל תקיפה מבוסס על אירועים עם מחסומים, שמעביר את מודלים SOTA קיימים בהופעה על קבוצת מידע LJP סטנדרטית.', 'bo': 'While significant progress has been made on the task of Legal Judgment Prediction (LJP) in recent years, the incorrect predictions made by SOTA LJP models can be attributed in part to their failure to (1) locate the key event information that determines the judgment, and (2) exploit the cross-task consistency constraints that exist among the subtasks of LJP. To address these weaknesses, we propose EPM, an Event-based Prediction Model with constraints, which surpasses existing SOTA models in performance on a standard LJP dataset.'}
{'en': 'Achieving Conversational Goals with Unsupervised Post-hoc Knowledge Injection', 'ar': 'معايرة على مستوى الإجابة للإجابة الحرة لأسئلة الاختيار من متعدد', 'fr': 'Étalonnage du niveau de réponse pour la réponse libre aux questions à choix multiples', 'es': 'Calibración de nivel de respuesta para respuestas a preguntas de opción múltiple de forma libre', 'pt': 'Calibração em nível de resposta para resposta a perguntas de múltipla escolha de forma livre', 'ja': '自由形式多肢選択式質問回答のための回答レベルの較正', 'hi': 'नि: शुल्क-प्रपत्र एकाधिक विकल्प प्रश्न उत्तर के लिए उत्तर-स्तर अंशांकन', 'zh': '用自由多选择题答案级校准', 'ru': 'Калибровка на уровне ответов для ответов на вопросы с множественным выбором в свободной форме', 'ga': 'Calabrú Freagra-Leibhéil le haghaidh Freagra ar Cheisteanna Ilroghnacha Saorfhoirme', 'ka': 'პასუხის დონე კალიბრება თავისუფალი ფორმების მრავალ მონიშნული კითხვის პასუხისთვის', 'hu': 'Válasz szintű kalibrálás ingyenes formájú többválasztási kérdések megválaszolásához', 'el': 'βαθμονόμηση επιπέδου απάντησης για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων πολλαπλής επιλογής ελεύθερης μορφής', 'it': 'Calibrazione a livello di risposta per risposta libera alle domande a scelta multipla', 'kk': 'Жауап деңгейі бос пішінде бірнеше таңдау сұрақ жауап беру үшін калибрлеу', 'lt': 'Atsakymų lygis laisvos formos kelių pasirinkimo klausimų atsakymui', 'mk': 'Калибрација на нивото на одговор за одговор на прашања со слободен форма со повеќе избори', 'ml': 'സ്വതന്ത്ര രൂപത്തില്\u200d പല തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉത്തരം നില ക്ലിബ്രേഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Хариулт түвшинд үнэгүй хэлбэрийн олон сонголтын асуулт хариулт', 'ms': 'Kalibrasi Aras Jawab untuk Jawab soalan Pilihan Berlipat-Bebas', 'mt': 'Kalibrazzjoni fil-livell tat-tweġiba għat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’għażla multipla b’forma ħielsa', 'no': 'Svarnivåkalibrering for friforma fleire val svar', 'pl': 'Kalibracja na poziomie odpowiedzi dla odpowiedzi na pytania wielokrotnego wyboru', 'ro': 'Calibrare la nivel de răspuns pentru răspunsul la întrebări cu răspunsuri multiple', 'sr': 'Kalibracija na nivou odgovora za slobodne oblike odgovor na više izbora', 'so': 'Heshiiska jawaabta ee heerka ugu habboon lacag-formiga Doorasho Multiple Questions', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කැලිබ්\u200dරේෂණය නිදහස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න', 'sv': 'Kalibrering på svarsnivå för flervalsfrågor i fri form', 'ta': 'இலவச- வடிவத்திற்கான பதில்- மட்டத்தின் அளவிடுதல்', 'ur': 'آزاد-فرم چند انتخاب سوال جواب کے لئے جواب-سطح کالیبریج', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Trình cân chỉnh cấp trả lời cho câu hỏi giải thích đa dạng tự do', 'bg': 'Калибриране на ниво отговор за отговор на въпроси с многократен избор на свободна форма', 'nl': 'Kalibratie op antwoordniveau voor het beantwoorden van meerkeuzevragen in vrije vorm', 'da': 'Kalibrering på svarniveau til gratis flere valgmuligheder besvarelse af spørgsmål', 'hr': 'Kalibracija nivoa odgovora na slobodno obliku odgovora na više izbora', 'de': 'Kalibrierung auf Antwortebene für die Beantwortung von Multiple Choice-Fragen in freier Form', 'id': 'Kalibrasi tingkat jawaban untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Pilihan Bebas', 'ko': '자유선택문제 답안수준 교정', 'sw': 'Calibration for Free-Form Choice Multiple Question Answering', 'fa': 'کلیبرار سطح پاسخ برای پاسخ سوال چند انتخاب آزاد', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'tr': 'Özgür-şekilde birnäçe saýlaw soragy jogaplamak üçin jogap derejesi kalibrasiýa', 'af': 'Antwoord- vlak kalibrering vir Vry- vorm Veelvuldige Keuse Vraog Antwoord', 'sq': 'Kalibrimi i nivelit të përgjigjes për përgjigjen e pyetjeve të zgjedhjeve të shumta në form ën e lirë', 'bn': 'ফ্রি ফর্ম বেছে নেওয়ার জন্য উত্তর- স্তরের ক্যালিবেশন', 'bs': 'Kalibracija nivoa odgovora na slobodno obliku odgovora na više izbora', 'hy': 'Անվճար ձևով բազմաթիվ ընտրության հարցերի պատասխանի մակարդակը', 'et': 'Vastuse taseme kalibreerimine vaba vormi mitme valikuvõimalusega küsimustele vastamiseks', 'az': 'Özgür şəkildə çoxlu seçim soruşu cavab vermək üçün cavab-səviyyəsi Kalibrəsi', 'ca': 'Calibració de nivell de resposta per respondre a preguntes de opció múltiple en forma lliure', 'cs': 'Kalibrace na úrovni odpovědi pro volné zodpovězení otázek s více volbou', 'fi': 'Vastaustason kalibrointi vapaamuotoiseen monivalintaiseen kysymykseen vastaamiseen', 'he': 'תשובה ברמה של תשובה לענות על שאלות בחירות רבות', 'sk': 'Kalibracija na ravni odgovorov za odgovor na vprašanja z več izbirami v prosti obliki', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'undo-type', 'bo': 'རིགས་མེད་པའི་རང་དབང་གི་འདེམས་སྟངས་ལ་མཐུན་པར་མཐུན་ཚད'}
{'en': 'A limitation of current neural dialog models is that they tend to suffer from a lack of specificity and informativeness in generated responses, primarily due to dependence on training data that covers a limited variety of scenarios and conveys limited knowledge. One way to alleviate this issue is to extract relevant knowledge from external sources at decoding time and incorporate it into the dialog response. In this paper, we propose a post-hoc knowledge-injection technique where we first retrieve a diverse set of relevant knowledge snippets conditioned on both the dialog history and an initial response from an existing dialog model. We construct multiple candidate responses, individually injecting each retrieved snippet into the initial response using a gradient-based decoding method, and then select the final response with an unsupervised ranking step. Our experiments in goal-oriented and knowledge-grounded dialog settings demonstrate that human annotators judge the outputs from the proposed method to be more engaging and informative compared to responses from prior dialog systems. We further show that knowledge-augmentation promotes success in achieving conversational goals in both experimental settings.', 'ar': 'أظهرت نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا مؤخرًا أن التدريب على مجموعات كبيرة باستخدام هدف النمذجة اللغوية يتيح إمكانات قليلة ومطلوبة في مجموعة متنوعة من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، بما في ذلك مهام التفكير المنطقي. يتم تحقيق ذلك باستخدام تفاعلات النص مع النموذج ، عادةً عن طريق طرح المهمة على أنها مشكلة إكمال نص بلغة طبيعية. في حين أن استخدام احتمالات نموذج اللغة للحصول على درجات مهمة محددة كان مفيدًا بشكل عام ، إلا أنه غالبًا ما يتطلب أساليب إرشادية خاصة بالمهمة مثل تطبيع الطول ، أو معايرة الاحتمالية. في هذا العمل ، نأخذ في الاعتبار تنسيق الإجابة على الأسئلة ، حيث نحتاج إلى الاختيار من بين مجموعة من الاختيارات النصية (ذات الشكل الحر) ذات الأطوال غير المحددة وفقًا للسياق. نقدم ALC (معايرة مستوى الإجابة) ، حيث يتمثل اقتراحنا الرئيسي في نمذجة التحيزات المستقلة عن السياق من حيث احتمال الاختيار دون السياق المرتبط وإزالته لاحقًا باستخدام تقدير غير خاضع للإشراف للتشابه مع السياق الكامل. نظهر أن معايرة مستوى الإجابة غير الخاضعة للإشراف لدينا تتحسن باستمرار أو تتنافس مع خطوط الأساس باستخدام مقاييس التقييم القياسية في مجموعة متنوعة من المهام بما في ذلك مهام التفكير المنطقي. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن مجموعات البيانات الشائعة من المحتمل أن تفضل النماذج المنحازة نحو الإشارات السهلة المتوفرة بشكل مستقل عن السياق. نقوم بتحليل مثل هذه التحيزات باستخدام درجة F1 المرتبطة. يشير تحليلنا إلى أن المعايرة على مستوى الإجابة قادرة على إزالة مثل هذه التحيزات وتؤدي إلى\nمقياس أكثر قوة لقدرة النموذج.', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados mostraram recentemente que o treinamento em grandes corpora usando o objetivo de modelagem de linguagem permite recursos de poucos tiros e tiros zero em uma variedade de tarefas de PNL, incluindo tarefas de raciocínio de senso comum. Isso é alcançado usando interações de texto com o modelo, geralmente colocando a tarefa como um problema de conclusão de texto em linguagem natural. Embora o uso de probabilidades de modelos de linguagem para obter pontuações específicas de tarefas tenha sido geralmente útil, geralmente requer heurísticas específicas de tarefas, como normalização de comprimento ou calibração de probabilidade. Neste trabalho, consideramos o formato de resposta a perguntas, onde precisamos escolher entre um conjunto de escolhas textuais (de forma livre) de comprimentos não especificados, dado um contexto. Apresentamos ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), onde nossa principal sugestão é modelar vieses independentes de contexto em termos da probabilidade de uma escolha sem o contexto associado e posteriormente removê-lo usando uma estimativa não supervisionada de similaridade com o contexto completo. Mostramos que nossa calibração de nível de resposta não supervisionada melhora consistentemente ou é competitiva com as linhas de base usando métricas de avaliação padrão em uma variedade de tarefas, incluindo tarefas de raciocínio de senso comum. Além disso, mostramos que conjuntos de dados populares potencialmente favorecem modelos tendenciosos para dicas fáceis que estão disponíveis independentemente do contexto. Analisamos esses vieses usando um F1-score associado. Nossa análise indica que a calibração do nível de resposta é capaz de remover tais vieses e leva a uma\nmedida mais robusta da capacidade do modelo.', 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados han demostrado recientemente que la capacitación en grandes corpus utilizando el objetivo de modelado del lenguaje permite capacidades de pocos disparos y cero en una variedad de tareas de PNL, incluidas las tareas de razonamiento de sentido común. Esto se logra mediante interacciones de texto con el modelo, generalmente planteando la tarea como un problema de finalización de texto en lenguaje natural. Si bien el uso de probabilidades de modelos de lenguaje para obtener puntuaciones específicas de tareas ha sido generalmente útil, a menudo requiere heurística específica de la tarea, como la normalización de la longitud o la calibración de probabilidad. En este trabajo, consideramos el formato de respuesta a preguntas, en el que necesitamos elegir entre un conjunto de opciones textuales (de forma libre) de longitudes no especificadas dado un contexto. Presentamos ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), donde nuestra sugerencia principal es modelar los sesgos independientes del contexto en términos de la probabilidad de una elección sin el contexto asociado y, posteriormente, eliminarla mediante una estimación no supervisada de la similitud con el contexto completo. Demostramos que nuestra calibración de nivel de respuesta no supervisada mejora constantemente o es competitiva con las líneas de base mediante el uso de métricas de evaluación estándar en una variedad de tareas, incluidas las tareas de razonamiento de sentido común. Además, mostramos que los conjuntos de datos populares favorecen potencialmente los modelos sesgados hacia señales fáciles que están disponibles independientemente del contexto. Analizamos estos sesgos utilizando una puntuación F1 asociada. Nuestro análisis indica que la calibración del nivel de respuesta puede eliminar dichos sesgos y conduce a una\nmedida más sólida de la capacidad del modelo.', 'fr': "Des modèles de langage pré-entraînés ont récemment montré que la formation sur de grands corpus utilisant l'objectif de modélisation linguistique permet des capacités limitées et nulles sur une variété de tâches de PNL, y compris les tâches de raisonnement de bon sens. Cela se fait en utilisant des interactions textuelles avec le modèle, généralement en présentant la tâche comme un problème de complètement de texte en langage naturel. Bien que l'utilisation des probabilités du modèle linguistique pour obtenir des scores spécifiques à une tâche ait été généralement utile, elle nécessite souvent des heuristiques spécifiques à la tâche, telles que la normalisation de la longueur ou l'étalonnage des probabilités. Dans ce travail, nous examinons le format de réponse aux questions, où nous devons choisir parmi un ensemble de choix textuels (de forme libre) de longueur non spécifiée en fonction du contexte. Nous présentons l'ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), où notre principale suggestion est de modéliser les biais indépendants du contexte en termes de probabilité d'un choix sans le contexte associé et de le supprimer ensuite à l'aide d'une estimation non supervisée de la similitude avec le contexte complet. Nous montrons que notre étalonnage des niveaux de réponse non supervisé s'améliore constamment par rapport aux niveaux de référence ou qu'il est compétitif par rapport aux niveaux de référence en utilisant des mesures d'évaluation standard pour diverses tâches, y compris les tâches de raisonnement de bon sens. De plus, nous montrons que les ensembles de données populaires peuvent favoriser les modèles biaisés vers des indices faciles qui sont disponibles indépendamment du contexte. Nous analysons ces biais à l'aide d'un score F1 associé. Notre analyse indique que l'étalonnage au niveau de la réponse est capable de supprimer de tels biais et conduit à une\nune mesure plus robuste de la capacité du modèle.", 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルは、最近、言語モデリング目標を使用した大規模なコーパスに関するトレーニングが、共通感のある推論タスクを含む、さまざまなNLPタスクのほとんどのショットおよびゼロショット機能を可能にすることを示しています。 これは、通常、タスクを自然言語のテキスト完了問題として提示することによって、モデルとのテキストの相互作用を使用して達成されます。 言語モデルの確率を使用してタスク固有のスコアを取得することは一般的に有用であったが、長さ正規化、または確率較正などのタスク固有のヒューリスティックを必要とすることが多い。 この研究では、質問回答形式を検討します。ここでは、文脈に応じて、指定されていない長さの（自由な形式の）テキストの選択肢から選択する必要があります。 ALC （ Answer - Level Calibration ）を提示します。ここでは、関連するコンテキストなしでの選択の確率の観点からコンテキストに依存しないバイアスをモデル化し、その後、完全なコンテキストとの類似性の監視されていない推定値を使用してそれを削除することを主な提案します。 私たちは、監督されていない回答レベルのキャリブレーションが、常識的な推論タスクを含むさまざまなタスクの標準的な評価指標を使用して、ベースラインよりも一貫して改善されるか、競争力があることを示しています。 さらに、人気のあるデータセットは、文脈から独立して利用可能な簡単な手がかりに偏ったモデルを好む可能性があることを示しています。 当社は、関連するＦ１スコアを使用して、そのようなバイアスを分析する。 当社の分析によると、回答レベルのキャリブレーションはそのようなバイアスを除去し、\nモデルの能力をより堅牢に測定します。', 'zh': '先训近明,用言建模在大语料库上可以在百NLP(及常识推理)上至少发零发。 此因用与模形之文本相成也,常以事为自然语言文本也。 虽用言语概率以得特定于分数常有用,然常须特定于任之启发式法,如长归一化概率校准。 于此,臣等思问答格式,须于给定上下文部未定长(自由)文本择之。 臣等建ALC(对案校准),其大要以无关上下文择概率建模于上下文之偏差,然后用与全上下文相似者无监度而删之。 臣等无监对校准在百务(常识推理)上用格评指标终优基线与基线竞。 此外,流行之数,或偏于上下文者也。 吾以相关之F1评分论此偏也。 臣等分析表明,答案水平校准能消此偏差,并致之\n更强模度。', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल ने हाल ही में दिखाया है कि भाषा मॉडलिंग उद्देश्य का उपयोग करके बड़े कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षण विभिन्न प्रकार के एनएलपी कार्यों पर कुछ-शॉट और शून्य-शॉट क्षमताओं को सक्षम बनाता है, जिसमें कॉमनसेंस रीजनिंग कार्य शामिल हैं। यह मॉडल के साथ पाठ इंटरैक्शन का उपयोग करके प्राप्त किया जाता है, आमतौर पर कार्य को एक प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ पूर्णता समस्या के रूप में प्रस्तुत करके। जबकि कार्य विशिष्ट स्कोर प्राप्त करने के लिए भाषा मॉडल संभावनाओं का उपयोग करना आम तौर पर उपयोगी रहा है, इसे अक्सर कार्य-विशिष्ट ह्यूरिस्टिक्स जैसे कि लंबाई सामान्यीकरण, या संभावना अंशांकन की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाले प्रारूप पर विचार करते हैं, जहां हमें एक संदर्भ को देखते हुए अनिर्दिष्ट लंबाई के (फ्री-फॉर्म) पाठ्य विकल्पों के एक सेट से चुनने की आवश्यकता होती है। हम एएलसी (उत्तर-स्तरीय अंशांकन) प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जहां हमारा मुख्य सुझाव संबंधित संदर्भ के बिना एक विकल्प की संभावना के संदर्भ में संदर्भ-स्वतंत्र पूर्वाग्रहों को मॉडल करना है और बाद में पूर्ण संदर्भ के साथ समानता के एक असुरक्षित अनुमान का उपयोग करके इसे हटा देना है। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारे असुरक्षित उत्तर-स्तर के अंशांकन में लगातार सुधार होता है या सामान्य ज्ञान तर्क कार्यों सहित विभिन्न प्रकार के कार्यों पर मानक मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके बेसलाइन के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी होता है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि लोकप्रिय डेटासेट संभावित रूप से आसान संकेतों के प्रति पक्षपाती मॉडल का पक्ष लेते हैं जो संदर्भ से स्वतंत्र रूप से उपलब्ध हैं। हम एक संबद्ध F1-स्कोर का उपयोग करके इस तरह के पूर्वाग्रहों का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हमारा विश्लेषण इंगित करता है कि उत्तर-स्तरीय अंशांकन इस तरह के पूर्वाग्रहों को दूर करने में सक्षम है और एक की ओर जाता है\nमॉडल क्षमता के अधिक मजबूत उपाय.', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные языковые модели недавно показали, что обучение на больших корпусах с использованием цели языкового моделирования дает возможность выполнять небольшие и нулевые выстрелы на различных задачах NLP, включая задачи здравого смысла. Это достигается с помощью текстовых взаимодействий с моделью, обычно представляя задачу как задачу завершения текста на естественном языке. Хотя использование вероятностей языковой модели для получения баллов по конкретной задаче было, как правило, полезно, часто требуется эвристика по конкретной задаче, такая как нормализация длины или калибровка вероятности. В этой работе мы рассмотрим формат ответа на вопрос, где нам нужно выбрать из набора (произвольной формы) текстовых вариантов неуказанных длин заданного контекста. Представляем ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), где нашим основным предложением является моделирование контекстно-независимых смещений с точки зрения вероятности выбора без связанного контекста и последующее удаление его с использованием неконтролируемой оценки сходства с полным контекстом. Мы показываем, что наша неконтролируемая калибровка на уровне ответов постоянно улучшается или конкурирует с базовыми линиями, используя стандартные метрики оценки для различных задач, включая задачи здравого смысла. Кроме того, мы показываем, что популярные наборы данных потенциально благоприятствуют моделям, ориентированным на легкие подсказки, которые доступны независимо от контекста. Мы анализируем такие погрешности, используя связанный балл F1. Наш анализ показывает, что калибровка на уровне ответов способна устранить такие смещения и приводит к\nповышение надежности измерения функциональных возможностей модели.', 'ga': 'Léirigh múnlaí teanga réamhoilte le déanaí go gcumasaíonn oiliúint ar chorpas mór a úsáideann an cuspóir samhaltaithe teanga cumais bheaga agus lámhaigh nialais ar éagsúlacht tascanna NLP, lena n-áirítear tascanna réasúnaíochta ciallmhara. Baintear é seo amach trí idirghníomhaíochtaí téacs leis an múnla a úsáid, go hiondúil tríd an tasc a chur i bhfeidhm mar fhadhb i gcrích téacs i dteanga nádúrtha. Cé go raibh sé úsáideach go ginearálta dóchúlachtaí eiseamláireacha teanga a úsáid chun scóir a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc a fháil, is minic a éilíonn sé heorastaíocht a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc ar nós normalú faid, nó calabrú dóchúlachta. Sa obair seo, breithnímid ar an bhformáid freagra ceiste, áit a gcaithfimid rogha a dhéanamh ó thacar de roghanna téacs (saorfhoirme) d’fhaid neamhshonraithe i bhfianaise comhthéacs. Cuirimid i láthair ALC (Calabrú Leibhéal Freagra), áit a bhfuil sé mar phríomh-mholadh againn laofachtaí comhthéacs-neamhspleách a shamhaltú i dtéarmaí dóchúlacht rogha gan an comhthéacs gaolmhar agus é a bhaint ina dhiaidh sin ag baint úsáide as meastachán cosúlachta gan mhaoirseacht leis an gcomhthéacs iomlán. Léirímid go dtagann feabhas leanúnach ar ár gcalabrú gan mhaoirseacht ar leibhéal na bhfreagraí nó go bhfuil sé iomaíoch le bonnlínte agus úsáid á baint as méadracht chaighdeánach mheastóireachta ar thascanna éagsúla lena n-áirítear tascanna réasúnaíochta ciallmhara. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go bhféadfadh tacair shonraí móréilimh a bheith i bhfabhar samhlacha atá claonta i dtreo leideanna éasca atá ar fáil neamhspleách ar an gcomhthéacs. Déanaimid anailís ar laofachtaí dá leithéid agus úsáid á baint as scór F1 gaolmhar. Léiríonn ár n-anailís go bhfuil calabrú ar leibhéal na bhfreagraí in ann laofachtaí den sórt sin a bhaint agus go dtiocfaidh a\ntomhas níos daingne ar chumas na samhla.', 'ka': 'პირველი განსწავლებული ენის მოდელები ახლა გამოჩვენეთ, რომ განსწავლება დიდი კოპორაზე, რომელიც გამოყენებული ენის მოდელური მიზეზი მოდელური მიზეზი დაახლოების შესაძლებლობა, რამდენიმე შესაძლებლობა და ნულ ეს მოდელთან ტექსტის ინტერფექციაციის გამოყენება, რომელიც საუკეთესოდ მოდელთან დამუშაობით რაოდენობის პრობლემა, როგორც თავისუფალური ენ ენის მოდელის შესაძლებლობების გამოყენება რაოდენობის განსაკუთრებული წერტილების მიღებად უფრო მხოლოდ გამოყენებული იყო, მაგრამ ეს უფრო გამოყენება რაოდენობის განსაკუთრებული ჰერისტი ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ კითხვის გასაგების ფორმატი, სადაც ჩვენ უნდა არჩეოთ ტექსტური არჩეულებების კონტექსტური სიგრძე, რომელიც კონტექსტური განსაზღვრებ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ALC (კალიბრება-დონეზე პასუხი), სადაც ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენება კონტექსტის განსარგებელი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობა შე ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი განსხვავებული პასუხის კალიბრება „კონპექტიურად გახდება ან კონპექტიურად გამოყენება სტანდარტული განსაზღვრებული მეტრიკის გამოყენება განსხვავებული რაოდენობის დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ პოლიპური მონაცემების კონტექსტიდან უკეთესებული მოდელების მონაცემები, რომლებიც ხელმისაწარმოდგენა ჩვენ ასეთი წარმოდგენების ანალიზაციას F1-სოფლიოს გამოყენებით. ჩვენი ანალიზია, რომ კალიბრება საპასუხის დონეზე შეუძლია ასეთი წინასწორებას წაშლა და გადატანა', 'el': 'Τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα έχουν δείξει πρόσφατα ότι η εκπαίδευση σε μεγάλα σώματα χρησιμοποιώντας τον στόχο μοντελοποίησης γλωσσών επιτρέπει δυνατότητες ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών και μηδενικών πυροβολισμών σε μια ποικιλία εργασιών συμπεριλαμβανομένων των εργασιών λογικής λογικής. Αυτό επιτυγχάνεται χρησιμοποιώντας αλληλεπιδράσεις κειμένου με το μοντέλο, συνήθως θέτοντας την εργασία ως πρόβλημα ολοκλήρωσης κειμένου φυσικής γλώσσας. Ενώ η χρήση πιθανών γλωσσικών μοντέλων για την απόκτηση ειδικών βαθμολογιών εργασίας ήταν γενικά χρήσιμη, συχνά απαιτεί heuristics ειδικά για την εργασία, όπως ομαλοποίηση μήκους ή βαθμονόμηση πιθανότητας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε τη μορφή απάντησης στις ερωτήσεις, όπου πρέπει να επιλέξουμε από ένα σύνολο (ελεύθερης μορφής) κειμενικών επιλογών μη καθορισμένων μήκους με δεδομένο ένα πλαίσιο. Παρουσιάζουμε τη βαθμονόμηση επιπέδου απάντησης, όπου η κύρια πρότασή μας είναι να μοντελοποιήσουμε προκατάληψη ανεξάρτητα από το πλαίσιο όσον αφορά την πιθανότητα επιλογής χωρίς το σχετικό πλαίσιο και στη συνέχεια να την αφαιρέσουμε χρησιμοποιώντας μια μη επιτηρημένη εκτίμηση ομοιότητας με το πλήρες πλαίσιο. Δείχνουμε ότι η βαθμονόμηση επιπέδου απάντησης χωρίς επίβλεψη βελτιώνεται συνεχώς ή είναι ανταγωνιστική με τις γραμμές βάσης χρησιμοποιώντας τυποποιημένες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης σε μια ποικιλία εργασιών, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των εργασιών λογικής λογικής. Επιπλέον, δείχνουμε ότι τα δημοφιλή σύνολα δεδομένων ευνοούν δυνητικά μοντέλα προκατειλημμένα προς εύκολες ενδείξεις που είναι διαθέσιμα ανεξάρτητα από το πλαίσιο. Αναλύουμε τέτοιες προκαταλήψεις χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σχετικό σκορ F1. Η ανάλυση μας δείχνει ότι η βαθμονόμηση επιπέδου απάντησης είναι σε θέση να αφαιρέσει τέτοιες προκαταλήψεις και οδηγεί σε', 'hu': 'Az előkészített nyelvi modellek a közelmúltban kimutatták, hogy a nyelvi modellezési célkitűzéssel végzett nagyvállalatokon végzett képzés néhány lövéses és nulla lövéses képességet tesz lehetővé a különböző NLP feladatok, beleértve a közértelmes érvelési feladatokat is. Ezt a modellel való szöveges interakciók segítségével érhetők el, általában úgy, hogy a feladatot természetes nyelvű szövegkiegészítő problémának nevezik. Bár a nyelvi modell valószínűségeinek használata a feladatspecifikus pontszámok megszerzéséhez általában hasznos volt, gyakran tevékenységspecifikus heurisztikát igényel, mint például a hosszúság normalizálása vagy a valószínűség kalibrálása. Ebben a munkában a kérdésre válaszoló formátumot vesszük figyelembe, ahol egy adott kontextusban meghatározatlan hosszúságú (szabad formájú) szöveges választások közül kell választanunk. Bemutatjuk az ALC-t (Answer-Level Calibration), ahol a fő javaslatunk az, hogy modellezzük a kontextusfüggetlen elfogultságokat a kapcsolódó kontextus nélküli választás valószínűségének valószínűsége szempontjából, és ezt követően eltávolítsuk a teljes kontextushoz való hasonlóság felügyelet nélküli becslésével. Megmutatjuk, hogy a felügyelet nélküli válasz-szintű kalibrálásunk folyamatosan javul vagy versenyképes a kiindulási értékekhez képest, szabványos értékelési mutatók segítségével különböző feladatokra, beleértve a közértelmes érvelési feladatokat is. Továbbá megmutatjuk, hogy a népszerű adatkészletek potenciálisan előnyben részesítik a könnyű utak iránti elfogult modelleket, amelyek a kontextustól függetlenül állnak rendelkezésre. Az ilyen előítéleteket egy kapcsolódó F1 pontszám segítségével elemezzük. Elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy a válaszszintű kalibrálás képes eltávolítani az ilyen előítéleteket, és', 'it': "Modelli linguistici pre-addestrati hanno recentemente dimostrato che la formazione su grandi corpora utilizzando l'obiettivo di modellazione linguistica consente funzionalità a pochi colpi e zero colpi su una varietà di attività NLP, incluse attività di ragionamento di buon senso. Ciò si ottiene utilizzando interazioni testuali con il modello, di solito ponendo l'attività come un problema di completamento del testo in linguaggio naturale. Sebbene l'utilizzo delle probabilità del modello linguistico per ottenere punteggi specifici per attività sia stato generalmente utile, spesso richiede euristiche specifiche per attività come la normalizzazione della lunghezza o la calibrazione delle probabilità. In questo lavoro, consideriamo il formato di risposta alle domande, in cui abbiamo bisogno di scegliere tra un insieme di scelte testuali (in forma libera) di lunghezze non specificate date un contesto. Presentiamo ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), dove il nostro suggerimento principale è quello di modellare pregiudizi indipendenti dal contesto in termini di probabilità di una scelta senza il contesto associato e di rimuoverlo successivamente utilizzando una stima non supervisionata di somiglianza con il contesto completo. Dimostriamo che la nostra calibrazione a livello di risposta non supervisionata migliora costantemente o è competitiva con le linee di base utilizzando metriche di valutazione standard su una varietà di attività, tra cui attività di ragionamento di buon senso. Inoltre, mostriamo che i set di dati popolari favoriscono potenzialmente modelli tendenti a facili indizi che sono disponibili indipendentemente dal contesto. Analizziamo tali pregiudizi utilizzando un punteggio F1 associato. La nostra analisi indica che la calibrazione a livello di risposta è in grado di rimuovere tali bias e porta a una", 'lt': 'Neseniai iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai parodė, kad mokymas didelėms korporams, naudojantiems kalbų modeliavimo tikslą, suteikia galimybę atlikti keletą nušaudytų ir nulinių nušaudytų užduočių, įskaitant bendrus motyvavimo uždavinius. Tai pasiekta naudojant teksto sąveiką su modeliu, paprastai užduotį vertinant kaip natūralią kalbos teksto užbaigimo problem ą. Nors kalbos modelio tikimybės buvo paprastai naudingos tam tikroms užduotims pasiekti, dažnai jai reikia užduotims būdingų heuristikų, pvz., ilgio normalizavimo arba tikimybės kalibravimo. Šiame darbe svarstome klausimų atsakymo form ą, kurioje turime pasirinkti iš (laisvos formos) tekstinių pasirinkimų, kurių ilgis nenurodytas atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes. Pateikiame ALC (atsakymų lygio kalibravimas), kur pagrindinis mūsų pasiūlymas yra modeliuoti nuo konteksto nepriklausomus pusiausvyras, atsižvelgiant į pasirinkimo tikimybę be susijusio konteksto, ir vėliau pašalinti jį naudojant nepastebimą panašumo įvertinimą visais kontekstais. Mes parodome, kad mūsų neatstebimas atsakymų lygio kalibravimas nuosekliai pagerina arba yra konkurencingas su bazinėmis linijomis, naudojant standartinius vertinimo rodiklius įvairioms užduotims, įskaitant bendrus motyvavimo uždavinius. Be to, mes rodome, kad populiarūs duomenų rinkiniai potencialiai skatina modelius, nukreiptus į paprastus ženklus, kurie yra prieinami nepriklausomai nuo konteksto. Analizuojame tokias nuokrypis naudojant susijusius F1 rezultatus. Mūsų analizė rodo, kad atsakymo lygio kalibravimas gali pašalinti tokius nukrypimus ir lemia', 'mk': 'Претренираните јазички модели неодамна покажаа дека обуката за големи корпора користејќи ја објективата за моделирање на јазиците овозможува мали и нула-стрелачки способности за различни задачи на НЛП, вклучително и заеднички размислувачки задачи. Ова се постигнува со користење на текстови интеракции со моделот, обично со ставање на задачата како природен проблем со завршувањето на текстот на јазикот. Иако користењето на веројатностите на јазичкиот модел за добивање специфични резултати за задачите е генерално корисно, честопати бара хеористика специфична за задачите како што е нормализацијата на должината или калибрација на веројатноста Во оваа работа, го разгледуваме форматот на одговорот на прашањата, каде што треба да избереме од множина (слободни) текстуални избори од неопределени должини со контекст. Презентираме ALC (Калибрација на нивото на одговор), каде што нашиот главен предлог е да се моделираат контекстно независни предрасуди во поглед на веројатноста на избор без поврзан контекст и потоа да се отстрани користејќи ненадгледувана проценка на сличност со целиот контекст. Ние покажуваме дека нашата ненадгледувана калибрација на нивото на одговор константно се подобрува над или е конкурентна со основните линии користејќи стандардни метрики за евалуација на различни задачи вклучувајќи заеднички размислувачки задачи. Further, we show that popular datasets potentially favor models biased towards easy cues which are available independent of the context.  Ние ги анализираме ваквите предрасуди користејќи поврзан резултат F1. Our analysis indicates that answer-level calibration is able to remove such biases and leads to a', 'ms': 'Model bahasa terlatih-awal baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa latihan pada korpra besar menggunakan objektif pemodelan bahasa membolehkan kemampuan tembak-sedikit dan tembak-sifar pada pelbagai tugas NLP, termasuk tugas alasan umum. Ini dicapai menggunakan interaksi teks dengan model, biasanya dengan meletakkan tugas sebagai masalah penyelesaian teks bahasa alami. Sementara menggunakan kebarangkalian model bahasa untuk mendapatkan skor khusus tugas telah secara umum berguna, ia sering memerlukan heuristik khusus tugas seperti normalisasi panjang, atau kalibrasi kebarangkalian. Dalam kerja ini, kita mempertimbangkan format jawapan soalan, di mana kita perlu memilih dari set pilihan teks (bentuk bebas) panjang tidak ditentukan diberi konteks. Kami perkenalkan ALC (Kalibrasi Aras-Jawab), di mana cadangan utama kami ialah untuk modelkan biases independen-konteks dalam terma kebarangkalian pilihan tanpa konteks terkait dan untuk membuangnya dengan menggunakan anggaran tidak diawasi persamaan dengan konteks penuh. Kami menunjukkan bahawa kalibrasi aras jawapan kami tidak diawasi secara konsisten meningkat lebih atau bersaing dengan garis dasar menggunakan metrik penilaian piawai pada pelbagai tugas termasuk tugas alasan umum. Lagipun, kami menunjukkan bahawa set data populer berpotensi mendukung model biased terhadap isyarat mudah yang tersedia bebas dari konteks. Kami menganalisis biases seperti ini menggunakan skor F1 yang berkaitan. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa kalibrasi aras jawapan boleh menghapuskan biases seperti ini dan membawa kepada', 'kk': 'Алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілерінде үлкен корпорада оқыту мақсатын қолдану үшін тіл моделі мақсатын қолдану үшін бірнеше NLP тапсырмалардың түрлі тапсырмаларында, көпшілікті оқыту тапсырмаларында Бұл үлгімен мәтін қатынасы қолданады, әдетте тапсырманы тәуелді тіл мәтінді толтыру мәселесі ретінде орнатып тұрады. Тіл үлгісін қолдану үшін тапсырманың ерекше нәтижелерін алу мүмкіндіктері әдетте пайдалы болып тұрғанда, ол көбінде тапсырманың ерекше шеуристикасын, мысалы, ұзындығы, немесе Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз сұрақ жауап беру пішіміне сұрақ береміз, қайда біз мәтіндік ұзындығын таңдау керек болады. Біз ALC (Жауап деңгейінің калибрлеу) дегенді таңдаймыз. Біздің негізгі ұсынысымыз - контексті тәуелсіз тәуелсіз тәуелсіздік тәуелсіздік тәуелсіздік тәуелсіздіктерді үлгілеу және содан кейін оны толық контек Біз жауап-деңгейіндегі калибрлеріміздің стандартты бағалау метрикалығын қолданып, көпшілікті бақылау тапсырмаларды қолдану немесе негізгі жолдарымызды жақсы жасайды дегенді көрсетедік. Қосымша, мәліметтер деректер жиындары контекстің тәуелсіздігіне қатысты оңай белгілеріне қарсы үлгілерді қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл өзгерістерді F1- нәтижесімен анализирақ. Біздің анализиямыз жауап деңгейіндегі калибрлеу осылай өзгерістерді өшіруге болады.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel dan l-a ħħar urew li t-taħriġ fuq korporazzjonijiet kbar bl-użu tal-objettiv tal-mudell tal-lingwi jippermetti kapaċitajiet b’ftit skopijiet u b’żero skopijiet fuq varjetà ta’ kompiti NLP, inklużi kompiti ta’ raġunament komuni. Dan jinkiseb bl-użu ta’ interazzjonijiet tat-test mal-mudell, normalment billi l-kompitu jitqies bħala problem a naturali tat-tlestija tat-test lingwistiku. Filwaqt li l-użu tal-probabbiltà tal-mudell lingwistiku biex jinkisbu punteġġi speċifiċi għall-kompiti kien ġeneralment utli, ħafna drabi jeħtieġ ħewristiċi speċifiċi għall-kompiti bħan-normalizzazzjoni tat-tul, jew il-kalibrazzjoni tal-probabbiltà. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nqisu l-format tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, fejn jeħtieġ li nagħżlu minn sett ta’ għażliet testwali (f’form a ħielsa) ta’ tul mhux speċifikat minħabba kuntest. Aħna nippreżentaw ALC (Kalibrazzjoni tal-Livell ta’ Rispons), fejn is-suġġeriment ewlieni tagħna huwa li nimmudellaw preġudizzji indipendenti mill-kuntest f’termini tal-probabbiltà ta’ għa żla mingħajr il-kuntest assoċjat u li sussegwentement neħħuha bl-użu ta’ stima mhux sorveljata ta’ similarità mal-kuntest sħiħ. Aħna nuru li l-kalibrazzjoni tagħna mhux sorveljata fil-livell ta’ tweġiba b’mod konsistenti ttejjeb lil hinn minn jew hija kompetittiva mal-linji bażi bl-użu ta’ metriċi standard ta’ evalwazzjoni fuq varjetà ta’ kompiti inklużi kompiti ta’ raġunament komuni. Barra minn hekk, nuru li settijiet ta’ dejta popolari potenzjalment jiffavorixxu mudelli bi preġudizzju lejn sinjali faċli li huma disponibbli indipendentement mill-kuntest. Nianalizzaw tali preġudizzji bl-użu ta’ punteġġ F1 assoċjat. Our analysis indicates that answer-level calibration is able to remove such biases and leads to a', 'ml': 'മുന്\u200dപരിശീലന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d അടുത്ത് കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു ഭാഷ മോഡലിങ്ങ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഭാഷ മാതൃകയില്\u200d പരിശീലനം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നത്, വ്യത്യസ്തമായി  മോഡലുമായി പദാവലിയുടെ ഇടപാടുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഇത് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണയായി ജോലി സ്വാഭാവികമാ ജോലി പ്രത്യേക സ്കോര്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അത് സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. നീളം സ്വാധാരണമാക്കുന് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ഫോര്\u200dമാറ്റില്\u200d നിന്ന് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്, ഒരു കൂട്ടിയ (സ്വതന്ത്ര-ഫോ)  നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ആല്\u200dസി (ഉത്തരം- നില ക്ലിബ്രേഷന്\u200d) കാണിക്കുന്നു. സമ്മതിക്കാത്ത ഒരു തെരഞ്ഞെടുപ്പിന്റെ സാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത ഒരു തെരഞ്ഞെടുപ്പിന്റെ സ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഉത്തരമുള്ള ക്ലിബ്രേഷന്\u200d , തീര്\u200dച്ചയായും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുകയോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സാധാരണ വിലാസങ്ങള അതിനുശേഷം, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധ്യതയോടെ പ ഒരു ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട F1 സ്കോര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഇങ്ങനെ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു ഉത്തരമുള്ള നിലപാടുകള്\u200d നീക്കം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d കഴിയും എന്നിട്ട് ഒരു പ്ര', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe pokazały ostatnio, że szkolenia na dużych korporach przy użyciu obiektu modelowania językowego umożliwiają niewielkie i zerowe możliwości dotyczące różnych zadań NLP, w tym zadań rozumowania zdrowego rozsądku. Osiąga się to za pomocą interakcji tekstowych z modelem, zwykle poprzez postawienie zadania jako problemu uzupełniania tekstu w języku naturalnym. Podczas gdy używanie prawdopodobieństw modelu językowego do uzyskania wyników specyficznych dla zadania było ogólnie przydatne, często wymaga heurystyki specyficznej dla zadania, takiej jak normalizacja długości lub kalibracja prawdopodobieństwa. W niniejszej pracy rozważamy format odpowiedzi na pytania, w którym musimy wybrać spośród zestawu (wolnej formy) wyborów tekstowych o nieokreślonej długości w kontekście. Przedstawiamy ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), gdzie naszą główną sugestią jest modelowanie niezależnych od kontekstu uprzedzeń pod względem prawdopodobieństwa wyboru bez powiązanego kontekstu, a następnie usunięcie go przy użyciu bez nadzoru oszacowania podobieństwa do pełnego kontekstu. Pokazujemy, że nasza bez nadzoru kalibracja poziomu odpowiedzi konsekwentnie poprawia się lub jest konkurencyjna z liniami bazowymi przy użyciu standardowych wskaźników oceny różnych zadań, w tym zadań rozumowania zdrowego rozsądku. Ponadto pokazujemy, że popularne zbiory danych potencjalnie faworyzują modele stronnicze w kierunku łatwych wskazówek, które są dostępne niezależnie od kontekstu. Analizujemy takie uprzedzenia przy użyciu powiązanego z nim wyniku F1. Nasza analiza wskazuje, że kalibracja poziomu odpowiedzi jest w stanie usunąć takie uprzedzenia i prowadzi do', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite au arătat recent că instruirea pe corpore mari folosind obiectivul de modelare lingvistică permite capacități cu câteva șanse și zero-shot pe o varietate de sarcini NLP, inclusiv sarcini de raționament comun. Acest lucru se realizează utilizând interacțiunile text cu modelul, de obicei prin poziționarea sarcinii ca o problemă de completare a textului în limbaj natural. În timp ce utilizarea probabilităților modelului lingvistic pentru a obține scoruri specifice sarcinilor a fost în general utilă, adesea necesită euristică specifică sarcinilor, cum ar fi normalizarea lungimii sau calibrarea probabilității. În această lucrare, luăm în considerare formatul de răspuns la întrebări, în cazul în care trebuie să alegem dintr-un set de alegeri textuale (în formă liberă) de lungimi nespecificate date unui context. Vă prezentăm ALC (Calibrarea nivelului de răspuns), unde sugestia noastră principală este de a modela prejudecăți independente de context în ceea ce privește probabilitatea unei alegeri fără contextul asociat și de a o elimina ulterior folosind o estimare nesupravegheată a similarității cu contextul întreg. Aratăm că calibrarea noastră nesupravegheată la nivel de răspuns se îmbunătățește în mod constant sau este competitivă cu liniile de referință folosind măsurători standard de evaluare pentru o varietate de sarcini, inclusiv sarcini de raționament comun. Mai mult, arătăm că seturile de date populare favorizează potențial modele părtinitoare spre indicii ușoare care sunt disponibile independent de context. Analizăm astfel de prejudecăți folosind un scor F1 asociat. Analiza noastră indică faptul că calibrarea la nivel de răspuns este capabilă să elimine astfel de prejudecăți și duce la o', 'no': 'Førehandsvis språk-modeller har nyleg vist at opplæring på stor korpora med målet for språk-modellering slår på få bilete og null-bilete på mange ulike NLP-oppgåver, inkludert vanlege undersøkingsoppgåver. Dette er oppnådd ved å bruka tekstinteraksjonar med modellen, vanlegvis ved å plassera oppgåva som eit problem med fullføring av naturspråket. I tillegg til å bruka språk-modellen for å få oppgåvespesifikke poeng er det vanlegvis nyttig, krev det ofte hekuristiske oppgåvespesifikke, slik som lengde normalisering, eller sannsynleg kalibrering. I denne arbeiden ser vi på spørsmålformatet, der vi må velja frå eit sett av (friforma) tekstvalar med ikkje spesifiserte lengde som er gitt eit kontekst. Vi presenterer ALC (svarnivåkalibrasjon), der hovudforslag vår er å modellere kontekstavhengige forskyvingar ved hjelp av sannsynligheten for eit valet utan den tilknytte konteksten, og deretter fjerna det ved å bruka ein ikkje-oppretta estimating av likhet med den fulle konteksten. Vi viser at vår ulike kalibrering av svarnivået er konsekvent forbetra eller er konkurente med baselinjer ved hjelp av standardvaleringsmetrikk på ulike oppgåver, inkludert vanleg rasjonsbrukingsoppgåver. I tillegg viser vi at populære datasett potensielt støttar modeller mot enkle teikn som er tilgjengelege uavhengig av konteksten. Vi analyserer slike forskyvingar med eit tilknytt F1- poeng. Analysen vårt tyder på at kalibrering av svarnivået kan fjerna slike forsvinningar og føra til ein', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварууд саяхан том корпоратын сургалт нь хэл загварын зорилго ашиглаж хэлэлцэх зорилго нь NLP-ын олон ажил дээр хэдэн зураг болон зураг авах боломжтой байдаг. Энэ нь загвартай текст харилцааныг ашиглаж, үүнийг байгалийн хэл бүтээлтийн асуудал гэж байдаг. Холбооны загварын магадлал ашиглах нь ерөнхийдөө хэрэглэгддэг байсан ч, энэ нь ажлын тодорхой хэмжээний хэмжээний хувьд урт нормализаци, эсвэл магадлал калибр зэрэг хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажил дээр бид асуултын хариулт хэлбэрийг бодож үздэг. Хаана бид тодорхойлогдсонгүй урттай (үнэгүй хэлбэрээс) текст сонголтыг сонгох хэрэгтэй. Бид ALC (Хариулт-түвшин калибр) гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ бидний гол санал бол харьцуулалт-хамааралтай байдлын магадлал боломжгүй сонголтын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын загварын төлөвлөгөө юм. Бид хариулт хэмжээний шалгалтыг багасгаж чадахгүй хариулт хэмжээний шалгалтыг харуулж байна. Олон төрлийн ажил дээр стандарт шалгалтын метрикийг ашиглаж эсвэл өрсөлдөг. Дараа нь, бид олон нийтэд өгөгдлийн сангууд нөхцөл байдлаас хамааралтай хялбар загваруудыг дэмжих боломжтой болно. Бид үүнийг холбоотой F1 оноо ашиглан шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бидний шинжилгээнд хариултын түвшинд калибр нь ийм урвалыг устгаж,', 'sr': 'Pre obučeni jezički modeli nedavno su pokazali da obuka na velikoj korporaciji koristeći objekt za modeliranje jezika omogućava nekoliko pucnjava i nula-pucnjave na raznim zadacima NLP-a, uključujući obične razumne zadatke. To se postiže koristeći tekstske interakcije sa modelom, obično postavljajući zadatak kao problem završetka prirodnog jezika teksta. Iako je koristiti verovatnoće jezičkog modela za dobivanje određenih rezultata zadataka uobičajeno korisno, često zahteva hekuristiku specifične zadataka poput normalizacije dužine ili kalibracije verovatnoće. U ovom poslu razmišljamo o formaciji odgovarajućeg pitanja, gde moramo izabrati iz set a (slobodnog oblika) tekstualnih izbora neodređenih dužina pod kontekstom. Predstavljamo ALC (kalibracija nivoa odgovora), gdje je naš glavni predlog model a kontekstske nezavisne predrasude u smislu verovatnosti izbora bez povezanog konteksta i nakon toga ukloniti ga koristeći neodređenu procjenu sličnosti sa punim kontekstom. Pokazujemo da se naša nepotrebna kalibracija nivoa odgovora konsekventno poboljšava ili je konkurentna sa osnovnim linijama koristeći standardne procjene metrike na raznim zadacima, uključujući opšte razumljivanje zadataka. Nadalje, pokazujemo da popularne podatke potencijalno koriste modele predrasude prema lakšim znakovima koji su dostupni nezavisni od konteksta. Analiziramo takve predrasude koristeći povezani F1 rezultat. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da kalibracija nivoa odgovora može ukloniti takve predrasude i dovesti do', 'ur': 'اس سے پہلے تدریس کی زبان مدل نے اچھا دکھایا ہے کہ زبان موڈلینگ موضوع کے مطابق بڑے کورپور پر تدریس کی تعلیم کم-شٹ اور صفر-شٹ کے قابلیت کو NLP کے مختلف کاموں پر امکان دیتی ہے، اس کے شامل عامل سمجھنے کے کاموں میں شامل یہ موڈل کے ساتھ متن تخلیق کا استعمال کر رہا ہے، معمولاً اس کام کو طبیعی زبان متن کامل مشکل کے طور پر ٹھہراتے ہیں. جب زبان موڈل کی امکانات کا استعمال کرتا ہے تابع مخصوص اسکو حاصل کرنے کے لئے، اس کے لئے بہت سے فائدہ ہے، اس کے لئے تابع-مخصوص حوریستیک کی ضرورت ہے جیسے طول نورمیزی، یا امکانات کی کالیبرا کی ضرورت ہے. ہم اس کام میں سوال کے جواب دینے کے فرمود کو سمجھتے ہیں، جہاں ہمیں ایک مجموعہ (آزاد فرمود) ٹیکسٹل انتخاب سے انتخاب کرنے کی ضرورت ہے جو ایک متوسط کے مقرر کئے گئے ہیں۔ ہم ALC (Answer-Level Calibration) کو پیش کرتے ہیں، جہاں ہمارا اصلی پیشنهاد یہ ہے کہ ایک انتخاب کے احتمال کے بغیر کسی متصل کے بغیر کسی انتخاب کی موجودگی کے مطابق مدل کرنا اور اس کے بعد اسے کامل متصل کے مطابق غیر قابل مقدار کے مطابق دور کرنا ہے. ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارے غیر قابل پاسخ سطح کی کیلیبراریشن ۔اس سے زیادہ بہتر ہوتا ہے یا اس سے مسابقه ہوتا ہے کہ اسٹارڈ ارزیابی متریک کے استعمال کرتا ہے ایک طرح کے کاموں میں جن کے شامل عمومی سمجھنے کے کاموں میں۔ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ جماعت ڈاٹ سٹ شاید آسانی نشانیوں کی طرف منتظر ہونے والی مدلکوں کو مہربانی کرتا ہے جو محیط سے بے نیاز موجود ہیں. ہم اس طرح کی مخالفت کو ایک مرتبہ F1-Score کے مطابق تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ہماری تحلیل نشان دیتا ہے کہ جواب سطح کی کالیبریٹ ایسی مخالفت کو ہٹا سکتی ہے', 'sv': 'Förtränade språkmodeller har nyligen visat att träning på stora korpora med hjälp av språkmodelleringsmålet möjliggör möjligheter med få skott och nollskott på en mängd olika NLP-uppgifter, inklusive förnuftiga resonemangsuppgifter. Detta uppnås med hjälp av textinteraktioner med modellen, vanligtvis genom att ställa uppgiften som ett naturligt språkkompletteringsproblem. Även om det i allmänhet har varit användbart att använda språkmodellsannolikheter för att erhålla uppgiftsspecifika poäng, kräver det ofta uppgiftsspecifika heuristiker som längdnormalisering eller sannolikhetskalibrering. I detta arbete överväger vi frågesvarsformatet, där vi behöver välja mellan en uppsättning (fri form) textval av ospecificerade längder givet ett sammanhang. Vi presenterar ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), där vårt huvudsakliga förslag är att modellera kontextoberoende fördomar i termer av sannolikheten för ett val utan det associerade sammanhanget och därefter ta bort det med hjälp av en oövervakad uppskattning av likhet med hela sammanhanget. Vi visar att vår oövervakade kalibrering på svarsnivå konsekvent förbättras jämfört med eller är konkurrenskraftig med baselines med hjälp av standardiserade utvärderingsmetoder för en mängd olika uppgifter inklusive förnuftiga resonemangsuppgifter. Vidare visar vi att populära datauppsättningar potentiellt gynnar modeller som är partiska mot enkla ledtrådar som är tillgängliga oberoende av sammanhanget. Vi analyserar sådana fördomar med hjälp av en tillhörande F1-poäng. Vår analys indikerar att kalibrering på svarsnivå kan ta bort sådana fördomar och leder till en', 'so': "Tusaalada afka hore ee la tababaray waxay tuseen in wax lagu baranayo shirkad waaweyn oo lagu isticmaalayo hagitaanka muusikada luuqada waxaa lagu qaban karaa awoodo yar iyo zero-ganacsi ah shaqooyinka NLP oo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo kamid ah shaqooyin ku saabsan waxqabadka ganacsiga. This is achieved using text interactions with the model, usually by posing the task as a natural language text completion problem.  Inta lagu isticmaalayo tusaale ahaan luuqada oo suurtagal ah in lagu helo qiimaha shaqo gaar ah, waxaa inta badan loo baahan yahay hiuristis cayiman, tusaale ahaan dhaadheerka caadi ah ama xisaabta suurtagalka ah. Markaas waxan, waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa foomka jawaabta su'aalka, meesha aannu uga dooran doonno doorasho qoraal ah oo aan la aqoon muddo dheer ah oo lagu qoray. Waxaynu soo wadaynaa ALC (Kalibration-Level), meesha lagu soo jeedayo in lagu sameynayo qalabka hoose-xor ah, marka laga yaabo in doorasho a an la xiriirin iyo dabadeedna in lagu rido qiimaha aan la ilaalinayn isku mid ah oo buuxda. Waxaynu muujinnaa in kalibsashada heerka jawaabta ee aan la ilaalinayn ay si joogto ah u bedeshaa ama ay u tartamaan inay isticmaalaan metricooyinka qiimeynta standardka ah oo ku saabsan shaqooyin kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah shaqooyin ku saabsan waxqabadka ganacsiga. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa in macluumaadka dadka maarufu ay sameeyaan tusaalooyin aad u raalli karto oo ay u leeyihiin cudurada fudud, kuwaas oo ay ka heli karaan mid aan ka xor ahayn daboolka. Waxaynu ku analyeynaa tababaradaas oo kale, waxaynu isticmaalnaa iskuul F1 ah. Analyskayagu wuxuu muujin karaa in kalibrinta heerka jawaabta uu awoodo inuu dhaqaajiyo tababaradan oo uu ku hoggaamiyo", 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகள் சமீபத்தில் பெரிய நிறுவனத்தில் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி பொருளை பயன்படுத்தி சில சுட்டி மற்றும் பூச்சி இது மாதிரியுடன் உரை இடைமுறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி பெற்றது, வழக்கமாக செயலை இயல்பான மொழி முடிவு பிரச்சனையாக ஏற்படுத்து செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட மதிப்பெண்களை பெற மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தும் போது அது பொதுவாக பயனுள்ளது, அது செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட உயரம் நீளம் இயல்பா இந்த வேலையில், நாம் கேள்வி பதில் கூறும் வடிவத்தை கருத்துக் கொள்கிறோம். குறிப்பிடாத நீளம் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ள ஒரு சில (இலவச- வடி நாங்கள் ALC (பதில்- மட்டத்தை அழிப்பது, எங்கள் முக்கிய பரிந்துரைப்பு, தொடர்புடைய சூழல் இல்லாமல் தேர்வை மாற்ற வேண்டும் என்பது தெரிவின் சாத்தியமான பிரச்சனைகளை மாற நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் எங்கள் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத விடை- மட்டத்தின் அளவிப்புகள் .. தொடர்ந்து மேலும் மேம்படுத்தப்படுகிறது அல்லது அடிப்படைகளுடன் போராட மேலும், பிரபலமான தகவல் அமைப்புகள் சாத்தியமான ஆதரவு மாதிரிகளை காட்டுகிறோம். சுலபமான கூட்டத்திற்கு எதிராக பாது F1- மதிப்பெண்ணை பயன்படுத்தி இவ்வாறு பிரச்சனைகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். நம்முடைய ஆய்வு குறிப்பிடுகிறது விடை-மட்டத்தின் அளவிப்பு இத்தகைய நடப்புகளை நீக்க முடியும் என்பதை கு', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේලන් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි ලොකු කොර්පෝරා වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය භාෂා කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේලන් අරමුණ භා මේක සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව පාළුව සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය භාවිත කරන්න විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය ලැබීමට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න, ඒක සම මේ වැඩේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා ප්\u200dරමාණයක් හිතනවා, කොහෙද අපිට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න ඕනේ  අපි ALC (Answer-Level Caliberation) ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, කොහෙද අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති තෝරණයේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති වි අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැති ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කැලිබ්\u200dරේෂණය ∙ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ව තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණයේ දත්ත සේට් සමහර විශේෂයෙන් පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුව අපි ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා F1- ස්කෝර් එකක් භාවිත කරන්න. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිච්චි ලේවල් කැලිබ්\u200dරේෂණය එහෙම ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් අතිරික්ෂ', 'uz': "Yaqinda o'rganilgan tillar modellarini ko'rsatadi, bu tilning modelli obʼektlarini foydalanish uchun katta kompaniyadan foydalanish imkoniyatlarini ko'rsatadi va NLP vazifalari bilan bir necha shaklga oshirish imkoniyatlarini qo'llash mumkin. Name While using language model probabilities to obtain task specific scores has been generally useful, it often requires task-specific heuristics such as length normalization, or probability calibration.  Bu vazifanda, biz savol javob beruvchi formatlarini tasavvur qilamiz. Bu yerda, biz notoʻgʻri muddati koʻrsatilmagan cheksiz matn choʻplarini tanlashimiz kerak. Biz ALC (Javob- daraja kalitlash) hozir qilamiz. Bu yerda bizning asosiy imkoniyatlarimiz buni bogʻ'liq tarkibi bilan tanlash imkoniyatlarini modellash mumkin va keyin buni butun tarkibi bilan saqlab qolmagan qiymatdan foydalanish mumkin. Biz xavfsiz qilmagan javob kalitlarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, butunlay bir necha vazifalar bilan standard qiymatning metriklari bilan bir xil vazifalar bilan ishlab chiqarishimizni ko'rsatadilar. Ko'rsatganimiz, popular maʼlumot qo'llanmalarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, oddiy xuddi qo'llangan modellarni o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu muhimkoniyatlarni saqlab boʻlmaydi. Biz buni bir bogʻliq F1 scori bilan aniqlanamiz. Analytikiz esa javob darajadagi kalitlarini olib tashlash mumkin va bu hodisaga\nmodel qobiliyatini ko'rsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Những mẫu ngôn ngữ được đào tạo trước gần đây đã cho thấy rằng tập luyện trên cơ thể lớn dùng mục tiêu tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ cho khả năng ít chụp ảnh và bắn không có ảnh trong nhiều công việc lập trình ngôn ngữ, bao gồm các công việc lập luận thông thường. Việc này được thực hiện bằng cách sử dụng tương tác văn bản với mô hình, thường bằng cách đặt nhiệm vụ như một vấn đề điền nốt văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong khi sử dụng khả năng của mô- đun ngôn ngữ để đạt được điểm đặc biệt của nhiệm vụ thì thường rất hữu ích, nhưng nó cũng yêu cầu thần kinh đặc nhiệm, như là quy định độ dài, hoặc định tỷ lệ. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi xem xét định dạng trả lời câu hỏi, nơi chúng tôi cần phải chọn trong một bộ các lựa chọn văn bản (dạng tự do) của độ dài không xác định được cho một ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi giới thiệu ALC (Bố thí Trình độ Trả lời), nơi chúng tôi đề nghị chính là mô phỏng các giả lập dựa trên khả năng có thể lựa chọn mà không có ngữ cảnh tương ứng và sau đó gỡ bỏ nó bằng một ước lượng không giám sát về giống nhau với hoàn cảnh. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc điều chỉnh cấp độ trả lời không giám sát của chúng tôi luôn cải thiện và cạnh tranh với các đường hầm sử dụng các âm lượng đánh giá chuẩn cho các công việc bao gồm các công việc lý hợp lý. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy các bộ dữ liệu phổ biến có khả năng ủng hộ các mô hình nghiêng về những dấu hiệu dễ dàng, không phụ thuộc vào ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi phân tích các giả dạng này bằng một số F1. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng cân chỉnh trình độ trả lời có khả năng gỡ bỏ các giả lập và dẫn đến\nkhả năng mô hình mạnh hơn.', 'nl': "Vooropgeleide taalmodellen hebben onlangs aangetoond dat training op grote corpora's met behulp van de doelstelling voor taalmodellering weinig- en zero-shot-mogelijkheden mogelijk maakt voor een verscheidenheid aan NLP-taken, waaronder verstandelijke redeneringstaken. Dit wordt bereikt met behulp van tekstinteracties met het model, meestal door de taak te stellen als een probleem met het voltooien van tekst in natuurlijke taal. Hoewel het gebruik van taalmodel waarschijnlijkheden voor het verkrijgen van taakspecifieke scores over het algemeen nuttig is geweest, vereist het vaak taakspecifieke heuristieken zoals lengtennormalisatie of waarschijnlijkheidskalibratie. In dit werk kijken we naar het vragenantwoordformaat, waarbij we moeten kiezen uit een reeks (vrije) tekstkeuzes van niet-gespecificeerde lengtes in een context. We presenteren ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), waarbij onze belangrijkste suggestie is om contextonafhankelijke biases te modelleren in termen van de waarschijnlijkheid van een keuze zonder de bijbehorende context en deze vervolgens te verwijderen met behulp van een onbeheerde schatting van gelijkenis met de volledige context. We laten zien dat onze onbeheerde kalibratie op antwoordniveau consistent verbetert boven of concurrerend is met baselines met behulp van standaard evaluatiestatistieken voor een verscheidenheid van taken, waaronder taken met gezond verstand. Verder laten we zien dat populaire datasets mogelijk de voorkeur geven aan modellen die gericht zijn op eenvoudige aanwijzingen die onafhankelijk van de context beschikbaar zijn. We analyseren dergelijke vooroordelen met behulp van een bijbehorende F1-score. Onze analyse geeft aan dat kalibratie op antwoordniveau dergelijke biases kan verwijderen en leidt tot een\neen robuustere meting van het vermogen van het model.", 'da': 'Forududdannede sprogmodeller har for nylig vist, at træning på store korpora ved hjælp af sprogmodelleringsmålet muliggør nogle få skud- og nul-skud-funktioner på en række NLP-opgaver, herunder almindelige ræsonnementsopgaver. Dette opnås ved hjælp af tekstinteraktioner med modellen, normalt ved at stille opgaven som et naturligt sprog tekst kompletteringsproblem. Selvom det generelt har været nyttigt at bruge sprogmodelssandsynligheder til at opnå opgavespecifikke scorer, kræver det ofte opgavespecifikke heuristikker, såsom længde normalisering eller sandsynlighed kalibrering. I dette arbejde overvejer vi spørgsmålsbesvarelsesformatet, hvor vi skal vælge mellem et sæt af (friform) tekstvalg af uspecificerede længder givet en kontekst. Vi præsenterer ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), hvor vores primære forslag er at modellere kontekstafhængige fordomme i forhold til sandsynligheden for et valg uden den tilknyttede kontekst og efterfølgende fjerne det ved hjælp af et ubevåget estimat af lighed med den fulde kontekst. Vi viser, at vores uautoriserede kalibrering på svarniveau konsekvent forbedres i forhold til eller er konkurrencedygtig med baselines ved hjælp af standard evalueringsmetrics på en række opgaver, herunder almindelige ræsonnementsopgaver. Desuden viser vi, at populære datasæt potentielt favoriserer modeller, der er forudindtaget mod nemme signaler, som er tilgængelige uafhængigt af konteksten. Vi analyserer sådanne fordomme ved hjælp af en tilknyttet F1-score. Vores analyse indikerer, at kalibrering på svarniveau er i stand til at fjerne sådanne skævheder og fører til en\nmere robust måling af modelkapacitet.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte Sprachmodelle haben kürzlich gezeigt, dass das Training auf großen Korpora mit dem Sprachmodellierungsziel Weniger- und Nullschuss-Fähigkeiten für eine Vielzahl von NLP-Aufgaben ermöglicht, einschließlich Aufgaben mit gesundem Verstand. Dies wird durch Textinteraktionen mit dem Modell erreicht, in der Regel indem die Aufgabe als Problem der Textvervollständigung in natürlicher Sprache dargestellt wird. Während die Verwendung von Sprachmodellwahrscheinlichkeiten zur Ermittlung aufgabenspezifischer Scores im Allgemeinen nützlich war, erfordert sie häufig aufgabenspezifische Heuristiken wie Längennormalisierung oder Wahrscheinlichkeitskalibrierung. In dieser Arbeit betrachten wir das Fragebeantwortungsformat, bei dem wir aus einer Reihe von (freien) Textwahlen von nicht spezifizierten Längen wählen müssen, wenn ein Kontext gegeben ist. Wir stellen ALC (Answer-Level Calibration) vor, bei dem unser Hauptvorschlag darin besteht, kontextunabhängige Verzerrungen hinsichtlich der Wahrscheinlichkeit einer Wahl ohne den zugehörigen Kontext zu modellieren und diese anschließend mittels einer unbeaufsichtigten Schätzung der Ähnlichkeit mit dem vollständigen Kontext zu entfernen. Wir zeigen, dass unsere unbeaufsichtigte Kalibrierung auf Antwortebene sich kontinuierlich verbessert oder mit Baselines konkurriert, indem Standardbewertungsmetriken für eine Vielzahl von Aufgaben verwendet werden, einschließlich Aufgaben mit gesundem Verstand. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass beliebte Datensätze Modelle bevorzugen, die auf einfache Hinweise ausgerichtet sind, die unabhängig vom Kontext verfügbar sind. Wir analysieren solche Verzerrungen anhand eines zugehörigen F1-Scores. Unsere Analyse zeigt, dass die Kalibrierung auf Antwortebene solche Verzerrungen beseitigt und zu einer\nrobustere Messung der Modellfähigkeit.', 'hr': 'Pretrenirani jezički modeli nedavno su pokazali da obuka na velikoj korporaciji koristeći cilj za modeliranje jezika omogućava nekoliko pucnjava i nula-pucnjave na raznim zadacima NLP-a, uključujući objašnjenje razumnih zadataka. To se postigne koristeći interakcije teksta s modelom, obično postavljajući zadatak kao problem završetka prirodnog jezika teksta. Iako je koristiti vjerojatnost jezičkog modela za dobivanje određenih rezultata zadataka uobičajeno korisna, često zahtijeva heuristiku specifične zadataka poput normalizacije dužine ili kalibracije vjerojatnosti. U ovom poslu razmišljamo o formaciji odgovarajućeg pitanja, gdje moramo odabrati iz skupa (slobodnog oblika) tekstualnih izbora neoodređenih dužina s obzirom na kontekst. Predstavljamo ALC (kalibracija nivoa odgovora), gdje je naš glavni predlog modelirati kontekstske nezavisne predrasude u smislu vjerojatnosti izbora bez povezanog konteksta i nakon toga ukloniti ga koristeći neodređenu procjenu sličnosti s punim kontekstom. Mi pokazujemo da se naša nepotrebna kalibracija nivoa odgovora stalno poboljšava ili je konkurentna s osnovnim linijama koristeći standardne procjene metrike na raznim zadacima uključujući zadatak razumljivanja uobičajenih smisla. Nadalje, pokazujemo da popularne podatke potencijalno podržavaju modele predrasude prema laganim znakovima koji su dostupni nezavisni od konteksta. Analiziramo takve predrasude koristeći povezani F1 rezultat. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da kalibracija nivoa odgovora može ukloniti takve predrasude i dovesti do\njača mjera mogućnosti modela.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените езикови модели напоследък показаха, че обучението върху големи корпуси, използвайки целта за езиково моделиране, позволява възможности за няколко и нулеви изстрели при различни задачи на НЛП, включително задачи за разумно разсъждаване. Това се постига с помощта на текстови взаимодействия с модела, обикновено чрез поставяне на задачата като проблем за завършване на текста на естествен език. Въпреки че използването на вероятностите от езиковия модел за получаване на специфични задачи като цяло е полезно, често изисква специфични задачи евристика като нормализиране на дължината или калибриране на вероятността. В тази работа разглеждаме формата на отговор на въпроси, при който трябва да изберем от набор от (свободни) текстови избори с неопределени дължини в даден контекст. Представяме Калибриране на ниво на отговор, където основното ни предложение е да моделираме независими от контекста отклонения по отношение на вероятността за избор без свързания контекст и впоследствие да го премахнем, като използваме ненаблюдавана оценка за сходство с пълния контекст. Ние показваме, че нашето ненадзорни калибриране на нивото на отговор последователно се подобрява или е конкурентно с базовите линии, използвайки стандартни показатели за оценка на различни задачи, включително задачи за разумно разсъждаване. Освен това показваме, че популярните набори от данни потенциално благоприятстват модели, предубедени към лесни знаци, които са достъпни независимо от контекста. Анализираме такива отклонения с помощта на свързан резултат от Формула 1. Нашият анализ показва, че калибрирането на нивото на отговор е в състояние да премахне тези отклонения и води до\nпо-стабилна мярка на капацитета на модела.', 'ko': '사전 훈련을 거친 언어 모델은 최근 언어 모델링 목표를 이용하여 대형 어료 라이브러리에 대해 훈련을 하면 각종 NLP 임무(상식 추리 임무 포함)에서 적은 슈팅과 제로 슈팅 능력을 실현할 수 있다고 밝혔다.이것은 텍스트와 모델의 상호작용을 통해 이루어진 것으로 보통 임무를 자연 언어의 텍스트로 설정하여 문제를 완성하는 것으로 이루어진다.언어 모델의 확률을 사용하여 특정 임무의 점수를 얻는 것은 일반적으로 유용하지만, 예를 들어 길이 표준화나 확률 교정 등 특정 임무의 계발식 방법을 필요로 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 문답 형식을 고려했는데, 그 중에서 우리는 상하문에 주어진 그룹 (자유 형식) 의 텍스트 선택에서 선택해야 한다. 이 텍스트 선택의 길이가 확실하지 않다.우리는 ALC(답안 수준 교정)를 제기했다. 그 중에서 우리의 주요 건의는 관련 상하문이 없는 상황에서 선택한 확률에 따라 상하문과 무관한 편차를 모델링한 다음에 완전한 상하문과 유사성을 가진 무감독 평가를 사용하여 이를 없애는 것이다.상식 추리 임무를 포함한 각종 임무에서 우리의 무감독 답안 수준 교정은 표준 평가 지표를 사용하는 기초를 바탕으로 지속적으로 개선되거나 경쟁력이 있음을 증명한다.그 밖에 유행하는 데이터 집합은 간단한 단서 모델에 치우칠 수 있고 이런 단서는 상하문에 독립된다.우리는 관련 F1 점수를 사용하여 이런 편차를 분석한다.우리의 분석에 의하면 답안 수준의 교정은 이런 편차를 없애고\n모형 능력의 더 안정적인 도량.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa lugha zilizojifunza hivi karibuni umeonyesha kuwa mafunzo katika makampuni makubwa kwa kutumia lengo la uthibitisho wa lugha inawezesha uwezo wa kuchukua risasi kidogo na kutoa risasi katika kazi mbalimbali za NLP, ikiwa ni pamoja na kazi zinazosababisha makubaliano ya umma. Hii imefanikiwa kwa kutumia mahusiano ya maandishi na mtindo huo, mara nyingi kwa kutumia kazi kama tatizo la kutimiza lugha za asili. Wakati kutumia mifano ya lugha huwezekana kupata vipimo maalum vya kazi vimekuwa na manufaa kwa ujumla, mara nyingi huhitaji vifaa maalum vya kazi kama vile upatikanaji wa muda mrefu, au uwezekano wa kuharibu. In this work, we consider the question answering format, where we need to choose from a set of (free-form) textual choices of unspecified lengths given a context.  Tunawasilisha ALC (Ujibu-Level), ambapo pendekezo letu la msingi ni kuonyesha upendeleo wa mazingira na uhuru katika hali ya uwezekano wa uchaguzi bila muktadha unaoelekezwa na baadae kuiondoa kwa kutumia kadiri isiyo sahihi inayofanana na muktadha mzima. Tunaonyesha kwamba ukarabati wetu wa kiwango cha jibu usio na uhakika wa kulinda, unaendelea kuboresha zaidi au anashindana na misingi ya msingi kwa kutumia mbinu za usambazaji wa kawaida katika kazi mbalimbali ikiwa ni pamoja na kazi zinazoelezea usalama wa umma. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kuwa taarifa maarufu huweka mifano yenye uwezekano wa kuipendelea kwa misitu rahisi ambayo inapatikana huru ya muktadha huo. Tunafahamu upendeleo huu kwa kutumia kipindi kinachohusiana na F1. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kwamba ukarabati wa kiwango cha jibu unaweza kuondoa upendeleo huu na kuongoza\nkiasi kikubwa cha uwezo wa mifano.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبانی اخیرا نشان داده\u200cاند که آموزش در شرکت بزرگ با استفاده از هدف مدل\u200cسازی زبان\u200cها توانایی کمی\u200cشلیک و صفر\u200cشلیک روی کار\u200cهای مختلف NLP را اجازه می\u200cدهد، شامل وظیفه\u200cهای منطقی معمولی. این با استفاده از ارتباطات متن با مدل رسیده می\u200cشود، معمولا با استفاده از کار به عنوان یک مشکل کامل کردن متن طبیعی زبان. در حالی که از احتمال مدل زبانی برای گرفتن امتیاز مشخص کار عموماً مفید بوده است، اغلب نیاز دارد که برای استفاده از احتمال مدل زبانی باشد، مانند طولانی\u200cسازی، یا کالیبرار احتمال باشد. در این کار، ما فرم جواب سوال را در نظر می گیریم، جایی که ما باید از یک مجموعه انتخاب آزاد (فرم آزاد) انتخاب کنیم از طول\u200cهای غیر مشخص به یک محیط. ما ALC را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، جایی که پیشنهاد اصلی ما این است که با استفاده از تقریبا با محیط کامل به عنوان احتمال انتخاب یک گزینه بدون محیط ارتباط و بعدش با استفاده از تقریبا غیر قابل قابل قابل قابل تحقیق با محیط کامل مدل کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که کالیبران سطح پاسخ غیرقابل توجه ما به طور کامل بهتر می شود یا با خطوط بنیادی با استفاده از متریک ارزیابی استاندارد بر روی کارهای مختلف شامل کارهای منطقی معمولی است. ما نشان می دهیم که مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای محبوب احتمالاً از مدل\u200cهای پیشرفت به نشانه\u200cهای آسان که در دسترس مستقل از محیط موجود هستند، به مدل\u200cها لطف می\u200cکنند. ما با استفاده از نقطه F1 مربوط به این موضوع تحلیل می کنیم. تحلیل ما نشان می دهد که کالیبران سطح پاسخ می تواند چنین پیشنهاد را از بین ببرد و به یک\nاندازه قوی تر از توانایی مدل.', 'af': "Vorige opgelei taal modele het onlangs vertoon dat opgelegging op groot korpora gebruik die taal modellering doel 'n paar-skoot en nul-skoot kapasiteite op 'n verskillende NLP taak, insluitend gemeenskaplike redekening taak. Hierdie word bereik met gebruik van teks interaksies met die model, gewoonlik deur die taak as 'n natuurlike taal teks voltooiing probleem te posieer. Terwyl die taal model waarskynlikheide gebruik word om taak spesifieke telling te kry, is dit algemeen nuttig, dit benodig gedeeltelik taak spesifieke heuristieke soos lengte normalisering of waarskynlik kalibrering. In hierdie werk, ons beskou die vraag antwoord formaat, waar ons moet kies van 'n stel van (vry-vorm) tekstuurkeuses van ongespesifiseerde lengte gegee 'n konteks. Ons stel ALC (Antwoord-Vlak Kalibraasie), waar ons hoofvoorstel is om konteks-onafhanklike voorskrifte te model in terms van die waarskynlik van 'n keuse sonder die geassosieerde konteks en om dit daarna te verwyder deur te gebruik 'n onverondersteunde estimatie van gelykenis met die volle konteks. Ons wys dat ons ongeonderwerpende antwoord-vlak kalibrering ’n konsistentlik verbeter oor of is kompetentaar met basisline met gebruik van standaard evalueringsmetries op ’n verskillende taak insluitend gemeenskapsse redensingstaak. Verder, ons wys dat populêre datastelle potensieal genade modele voorspoedig tot maklike tekens wat beskikbaar is onveilig van die konteks. Ons analyseer sodanige voorspoedies met gebruik van 'n geassosieerde F1- telling. Ons analisie wys dat antwoord-vlak kalibrering kan sodanige voorskrifte verwyder en na â\x80\x99n\nmeer kragtige maat van model kapasiteit.", 'id': 'Model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya telah menunjukkan bahwa pelatihan pada korpora besar menggunakan objektif model bahasa memungkinkan kapasitas beberapa tembakan dan nol tembakan pada berbagai tugas NLP, termasuk tugas pemikiran umum. Ini dicapai menggunakan interaksi teks dengan model, biasanya dengan menempatkan tugas sebagai masalah penyelesaian teks bahasa alami. Sementara menggunakan kemungkinan model bahasa untuk mendapatkan skor spesifik tugas secara umum berguna, sering membutuhkan heuristik spesifik tugas seperti normalisasi panjang, atau kalibrasi kemungkinan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita mempertimbangkan format jawaban pertanyaan, di mana kita harus memilih dari set pilihan teks (bentuk bebas) yang panjang tidak tertentu diberikan konteks. We present ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), where our main suggestion is to model context-independent biases in terms of the probability of a choice without the associated context and to subsequently remove it using an unsupervised estimate of similarity with the full context.  Kami menunjukkan bahwa kalibrasi tingkat jawaban kita tidak diawasi secara konsisten meningkat lebih atau kompetitif dengan garis dasar menggunakan metrik evaluasi standar pada berbagai tugas termasuk tugas pemikiran umum. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa dataset populer berpotensi mendukung model biased menuju tanda-tanda mudah yang tersedia bebas dari konteks. Kami menganalisis biases seperti itu menggunakan skor F1 yang terkait. Analisi kami menunjukkan bahwa kalibrasi tingkat jawaban mampu menghapus biases tersebut dan mengarah ke\nukuran kemampuan model yang lebih kuat.', 'sq': 'Modelet e paratrajnuara të gjuhës kanë treguar kohët e fundit se stërvitja në korpra të mëdha duke përdorur objektivin e modelimit të gjuhës lejon aftësitë me pak gjuajtje dhe zero gjuajtje në një varietet detyrash NLP, duke përfshirë detyrat e arsyetimit të zakonshëm. Kjo arrihet duke përdorur ndërveprime teksti me modelin, zakonisht duke e vendosur detyrën si një problem natyror për kompletimin e tekstit në gjuhë. Ndërsa përdorimi i probabiliteteve të model it gjuhësor për të marrë rezultate specifike të detyrave ka qenë përgjithësisht i dobishëm, ai shpesh kërkon heuristikë specifike të detyrave të tilla si normalizimi i gjatësisë apo kalibrimi i probabilitetit. Në këtë punë, ne konsiderojmë formatin që përgjigjet pyetjeve, ku duhet të zgjedhim nga një sërë zgjedhjesh tekstuale (të lira) me gjatësi të papërcaktuara të dhëna një kontekst. Ne paraqesim ALC, ku sugjerimi ynë kryesor është të modelojmë paragjykime të pavarura nga konteksti lidhur me probabilitetin e një zgjedhjeje pa kontekstin e lidhur dhe pastaj ta heqim atë duke përdorur një vlerësim të pazgjidhur të ngjashmërisë me kontekstin e plotë. Ne tregojmë se kalibrimi ynë i nivelit të përgjigjeve të pazgjidhur përmirëson vazhdimisht mbi apo është konkurrues me linjat bazë duke përdorur metrikat standarde të vlerësimit në një varietet detyrash duke përfshirë detyrat e arsyetimit të zakonshme. Further, we show that popular datasets potentially favor models biased towards easy cues which are available independent of the context.  Ne analizojmë të tilla paragjykime duke përdorur një rezultat F1 të lidhur. Analiza jonë tregon se kalibrimi i nivelit të përgjigjes është në gjendje të heqë të tilla paragjykime dhe çon në një\nmasa më e fortë e aftësisë së modelit.', 'tr': "Öňki bilinmeli dil nusgalary ýakynda uly korporada dili modelleýän maksadyny ulanan okuw nusgalarynyň NLP toparynyň birnäçe işinde az atly we 0-atly ukyplary mümkin edýär. Bu ýer mod bilen metin etkileşimlerini ullanýar, adatça buýruky tebigy dil metin tamamlama meselesi bolup duruşýar. Dil nusgasyny tapmak üçin belli sanlary ullanyp bilmek mümkinçiliki ullanyp durmuşy bejermek üçin bir nusgasyna seretseň, oňa köplenç täblisaň munuň düzümlenmesi ýaly durmuşy bejermek üçin bir heuristik isleýär. Bu işde, biz soraglaryň jogaplary şeklinde pikir edýäris, nähili belli bir kontekst berilmeýän (boş-şekilde) metin saýlawlaryny saýlamak gerek. Biz ALC'i (jogap-dereje kalibrasyny) berýäris, nirede esasy maslahatymyz kontekst-bağımsız biaslary görkezmäge mümkin däldir we soňra muny doly kontekst bilen garaşylmadyk deňleşmäge ulanyp çykarmakdyr. Biziň suytalanmaýan jogabat derejesiniň kalibrasymyz hemişe üstüne gelip ýa-da basit çyzgymlar bilen duşuşygymyz düzgün bolýar ýa-da düzgün deňlenme metriklerimizi birnäçe görevlerde karanly deňlenmek üçin düzgün bir şekilde üýtgeýäris. Mundan soňra, populer veri setirleriniň sistemasy sistemasynda ahyry nusgalaryň üstine alyp barýandygyny görkezýäris. Biz bu nähili faýllary bir F1 अंतर ullanýarys. Biziň analyzamyz jogabat derejesi kalibraciýanyň beýle bir sowuklamasyny çykaryp biler we bu durumda bir hereket edip biler.\nnusga ukyplarynyň köp ölçüsi.", 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল সম্প্রতি প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে ভাষা মডেলিং লক্ষ্য ব্যবহার করে বিশাল কোর্পোরায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে এনএলপি কাজের বিভিন্ন কাজ মডেলের সাথে টেক্সট ইন্টারেক্স ব্যবহার করে এটি অর্জন করা হয়, সাধারণত প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার টেক্সট সম্পূর্ণ সমস্যা হিস কাজের নির্দিষ্ট স্কোর পাওয়ার জন্য ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করার সম্ভাবনা সাধারণত কার্যকর হয়েছে, কিন্তু এটি প্রায়শই কাজ-বিশেষ হিউরিস্টিক্স এই কাজে আমরা প্রশ্নের উত্তরের বিন্যাস বিবেচনা করি, যেখানে আমাদের একটি সেট (মুক্ত ফর্ম) থেকে বেছে নিতে হবে যেখানে একটি নির্দিষ্ট দীর্ঘ সময় আমরা এলিসি (উত্তর-স্তর ক্যালিবেশন) উপস্থাপন করি। যেখানে আমাদের প্রধান পরামর্শ হচ্ছে সংযুক্ত প্রেক্ষাপট ছাড়া একটি পছন্দের মডেল করার সম্ভাবনা এবং পরে সেটা মুছে ফেলার জন্য এক আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের সংরক্ষিত উত্তর-স্তরের ক্যালিবেশন সবসময় উন্নত হয়ে যায় অথবা স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার মূল্যায়ন মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে বিভিন্ন কাজের উপরে প্রতিযো এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে জনপ্রিয় ডাটাসেট সম্ভাব্য ভালোবাসা মোডেল সহজ কুয়ার দিকে প্রতিযোগিতা করা হয়েছে, যা এই প্ We analyze such biases using an associated F1-score.  আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ নির্দেশ করছে যে উত্তর-স্তরের ক্যালেবিরেশন এই ধরনের বৈষম্য মুছে ফেলতে পারে এবং একটি প্রতিক্র\nমডেলের ক্ষমতার চেয়ে বেশী রোবট মাপ।', 'bs': 'Pretrenirani jezički modeli nedavno su pokazali da obuka na velikoj korporaciji koristeći objekt modeliranja jezika omogućava nekoliko pucnjava i nula-pucnjave na raznim zadacima NLP-a, uključujući objašnjenje razumnih zadataka. To se postigne koristeći tekstne interakcije sa modelom, obično pozicijom zadatka kao problem sa završavanjem prirodnog jezika teksta. Iako je koristiti vjerojatnost jezičkog modela za dobivanje određenih rezultata zadataka uobičajeno korisna, često zahtijeva heuristiku specifične zadataka poput normalizacije dužine ili kalibracije vjerojatnosti. U ovom poslu razmišljamo o formaciji odgovarajućeg pitanja, gdje moramo odabrati iz set a (slobodnog oblika) tekstualnih izbora neoodređenih dužina pod kontekstom. Predstavljamo ALC (kalibracija nivoa odgovora), gdje je naš glavni predlog model a nezavisne predrasude konteksta u smislu vjerojatnosti izbora bez povezanog konteksta i nakon toga ukloniti ga koristeći neodređenu procjenu sličnosti sa punim kontekstom. Pokazujemo da se naša nepotrebna kalibracija nivoa odgovora konsekventno poboljšava ili je konkurentna s osnovnim linijama koristeći standardne procjene metrike na raznim zadacima uključujući zadatak razumljivanja uobičajenih smisla. Nadalje, pokazujemo da popularne podatke potencijalno podržavaju modele predrasude prema lakšim znakovima koji su dostupni nezavisni od konteksta. Analiziramo takve predrasude koristeći povezani F1 rezultat. Naša analiza ukazuje na to da kalibracija nivoa odgovora može ukloniti takve predrasude i dovesti do\njača mjera mogućnosti modela.', 'ca': "Models de llenguatge pré-entrenats han demostrat recentment que l'entrenament en grans corpores utilitzant l'objectiu de modelació de llenguatge permet capacitats poc disparades i zero disparades en una varietat de tasques del NLP, incloent tasques de raonament comunes. This is achieved using text interactions with the model, usually by posing the task as a natural language text completion problem.  Mentre que utilitzar probabilitats del model lingüístic per aconseguir puntuacions específices de la tasca ha estat útil en general, sovint necessita heurístics específices de la tasca com la normalització de la llargada o la calibració de la probabilitat. In this work, we consider the question answering format, where we need to choose from a set of (free-form) textual choices of unspecified lengths given a context.  Presentam ALC (Calibració de nivell de resposta), on la nostra suggerició principal és modelar biases independents del context en termes de probabilitat d'una elecció sense el context associat i després eliminar-la fent servir una estimació no supervisada de similitud amb el context complet. Mostrem que la nostra calibració no supervisada del nivell de resposta millora constantment més o és competitiva amb les línies de base utilitzant les mètriques d'evaluació estándar en una varietat de tasques, incloent tasques comunes de raonament. També demostram que els conjunts de dades populars potencialment favoreixen models orientats cap a indicis fàcils que estan disponibles independentment del context. Analitzem aquestes tendències utilitzant una puntuació F1 associada. La nostra anàlisi indica que la calibració del nivell de resposta pot eliminar aquests prejudicis i porta a una\nuna mesura més robusta de la capacitat model.", 'am': 'የቀድሞው የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች፣ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ አካባቢ በተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ አካሄድ ላይ ትምህርት ማድረግ እና በቁጥር የኢንኤል ፕ ስራዎችን በተለየ ቁጥጥር ማድረግ እና በክፍለ ሥርዓት ላይ የሚቻለውን እና በክፍለ ሥርዓት ማድረግ እንዲችል ያሳ ይህ የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት በመጠቀም በሞዴል ላይ ይደረጋል፤ በተቀድሞም ስራውን እንደ ፍጥረት የቋንቋ ጽሑፍ መሙላት ጉዳይ በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ በተጠቃሚ የስራ ቁጥር ለመግኘት በተስፋት የተጠቃሚ ሆኖ ይጠቅማል፣ ብዙ ጊዜ እንደርዝመት ማቀናጃ ወይም ስህተት መጠቀም እንዲያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ የጥያቄውን መልስ ፎርማት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ አካባቢ ጉዳዩ ባይኖር ምርጫ ማሰናከል እና በኋላም ያልጠበቀው ቁጥጥር በሙሉ ግንኙነት በተደረገ መጠቀም እናስወግዳለን፡፡ የማይጠበቀው መልስ-ደረጃ ክሊምፕቦርት፣ ሁል ጊዜ በላይ እንዲሻል ወይም በተጨማሪው ማሰናከል ማድረጊያውን በመጠቀም ወይም በተለያዩ ስራዎች ላይ በተጨማሪው ማሰናከያ ማድረጊያውን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ፣ የዳታ ማህበረሰቢያ ማድረግ በተቃራኒ ኩነቶች ላይ የሚቃወሙትን የሞዴላዎችን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ We analyze such biases using an associated F1-score.  ትምህርታችን የመልስ ደረጃ ቁጥጥር እንደተካሄደው ይችላል፡፡\nየሞዴል ችሎታዋን የሚጨመር መስኮት::', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri çox böyük korporada təhsil edilməsini göstərmişdir ki, dil modellərinin məqsədili istifadə edərək, NLP işlərinin müxtəlif təhsil və sıfır fəaliyyətlərinin çoxluğunda fəaliyyətlər yaradır. Bu modellə mətn əlaqələrini istifadə edərək, bu işi təbiətli dil mətn tamamlama problemi olaraq yerləşdirir. Dil modeli ehtimallarını istifadə edərkən işləri müəyyən edilən mümkün olaraq çox faydalı idi, buna çox zaman uzunluğu normalizasyon və ya mümkün olaraq kalibrasyon kimi işləri müəyyən edilən heuristik lazımdır. Bu işdə, biz sual cavab vermək formasını düşünürük, bir məlumat verilmiş məlumatlardan seçmək lazımdır. Biz ALC (Answer-Level Calibration) ilə bildiririk, hansı an a təklifimiz, bağlı bir məlumat olmadan seçilmə mümkünlüyü və sonra onu tamamlama məlumatı ilə müəyyən edilməyən müəyyən edilməsi ilə dəyişdirməkdir. Biz müəyyən edilməmiş cavab-seviyyətimizin kalibrasiyasını göstəririk ki, əsas çətinləri istifadə edərək standart değerlendirmə metrikləri ilə müqayisədə daha yaxşılaşdırır və ya müqayisədə müqayisədə müxtəlif işlərdə müxtəlif fikirləşmə işləri də dahil edərlər. Daha sonra, qüvvətli verilən qurbanlar mümkün olaraq məlumatlardan bağımsız olduğu kolay məlumatlara təsirlənən modellərə təsirləndirilir. Bütün bu tərzlərini F1-score vasitəsilə analiz edirik. Bizim analizimiz cavab seviyyəsi kalibrasyonun böyük tərzlərini silə biləcəyi və\ndaha qüvvətli modellərin ölçüsü.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները ցույց են տվել, որ լեզվի մոդելավորման օբյեկտիվ օգտագործվող մեծ կապորանների ուսումնասիրությունը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմաթիվ և զրոյական կրակի հնարավորություններ ՆԼՊ-ի բազմաթիվ առաջադրան Սա հասնում է օգտագործելով տեքստի փոխազդեցություններ մոդելի հետ, սովորաբար առաջադրանքը դիտարկելով որպես բնական լեզվի տեքստի ավարտացման խնդիր: Մինչդեռ լեզվի մոդելի հավանականության օգտագործումը խնդիրների հատուկ գնահատականների հասնելու համար ընդհանուր առմամբ օգտակար է եղել, այն հաճախ պահանջում է խնդիրների հատուկ հորիստիկ, ինչպիսիք են երկարության նորմալիզացիան կամ Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք հաշվի ենք առնում հարցերին պատասխանելու ձևը, որտեղ մենք պետք է ընտրենք (ազատ ձևով) անորոշակի երկարությամբ ընտրված տեքստային ընտրություններից: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ALC-ը, որտեղ մեր հիմնական առաջարկությունը կոնտեքստի անկախ կոնտեքստի կոնտեքստի մոդելն է ընտրության հավանականության տեսքով առանց կապված կոնտեքստի և հետագայում հեռացնել այն օգտագործելով ամբողջ կոնտեքստի նմանության անվերահսկված հաշվարկը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր անվերահսկված պատասխանի մակարդակի կալիբրացիան անընդհատ բարելավում է կամ մրցակցում է հիմնական գծերի հետ, օգտագործելով ստանդարտ գնահատման մետրիկներ տարբեր առաջադրանքների վրա, ներառյալ ընդհանուր մտածողական առաջ Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հայտնի տվյալների համակարգերը պոտենցիալ օգնում են մոդելներ, որոնք կողմնականում են հեշտ նշանների վրա, որոնք հասանելի են անկախ կոնտեքստից: Մենք վերլուծում ենք նման կողմնականություններ օգտագործելով կապված F1-գնահատականը: Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ պատասխանի մակարդակը կարողանում է վերացնել նման կողմնականություններ և հանգեցնում է\nմոդելի ունակության ավելի ուժեղ չափումը:', 'et': 'Eelkoolitud keelemudelid on hiljuti näidanud, et keelemudelite modelleerimise eesmärki kasutav suurte korpuste koolitus võimaldab mitmesugustel NLP ülesannetel, sealhulgas üldiselt mõistlikel põhjendusülesannetel kasutada vähe- ja nullkontrolli võimalusi. Selleks kasutatakse mudeliga seotud tekstisuhteid, tavaliselt esitades ülesande looduskeelse teksti täitmise probleemina. Kuigi keelemudeli tõenäosuste kasutamine ülesandespetsiifiliste hinnete saamiseks on olnud üldiselt kasulik, nõuab see sageli ülesandespetsiifilisi heuristikaid, nagu pikkuse normaliseerimine või tõenäosuse kalibreerimine. Käesolevas töös kaalume küsimustele vastamise vormi, kus tuleb valida (vaba vormi) tekstivalikute hulgast määratlemata pikkusega kontekstis. Esitleme ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), kus meie peamine soovitus on modelleerida kontekstist sõltumatuid kallakusi valiku tõenäosuse osas ilma seotud kontekstita ning seejärel eemaldada see järelevalveta hinnangu abil sarnasuse kohta kogu kontekstiga. Näitame, et meie järelevalveta vastuste taseme kalibreerimine paraneb pidevalt või konkurentsivõimeline lähtejoontega, kasutades standardseid hindamismeetodeid mitmesuguste ülesannete puhul, sealhulgas mõistlike arutlusülesannete puhul. Lisaks näitame, et populaarsed andmekogumid võivad eelistada mudeleid, mis on suunatud lihtsatele märguannetele, mis on saadaval kontekstist sõltumatult. Analüüsime selliseid kallakusi, kasutades sellega seotud F1-skoori. Meie analüüs näitab, et vastuse taseme kalibreerimine suudab kõrvaldada sellised kallakud ja viib\nmudeli võimekuse tugevam mõõtmine.', 'cs': 'Předškolené jazykové modely v poslední době ukázaly, že školení na velkých korpusech s využitím cíle jazykového modelování umožňuje několik a nulových schopností pro různé úlohy NLP, včetně úloh zdravého uvažování. Toho je dosaženo pomocí interakcí textu s modelem, obvykle představením úkolu jako problému dokončování textu v přirozeném jazyce. Zatímco použití pravděpodobností jazykového modelu k získání hodnocení specifických úkolů bylo obecně užitečné, často vyžaduje heuristiku specifické pro úkoly, jako je normalizace délky nebo kalibrace pravděpodobnosti. V této práci se zabýváme formátem odpovědi na otázky, kde si musíme vybrat ze sady (volných) textových voleb nespecifikovaných délek v kontextu. Představujeme ALC (Odpověď-Level Calibration), kde naším hlavním návrhem je modelovat kontextově nezávislé předsudky z hlediska pravděpodobnosti volby bez souvisejícího kontextu a následně je odstranit pomocí neobsluženého odhadu podobnosti s celým kontextem. Ukazujeme, že naše kalibrace úrovně odpovědí bez dozoru trvale zlepšuje nebo je konkurenceschopná vůči základním liniím pomocí standardních hodnotících metrik u různých úkolů, včetně úkolů zdravého uvažování. Dále ukazujeme, že populární datové sady potenciálně upřednostňují modely zaujaté k snadným návodům, které jsou k dispozici nezávisle na kontextu. Tyto předsudky analyzujeme pomocí souvisejícího F1 skóre. Naše analýza ukazuje, že kalibrace úrovně odpovědi je schopna odstranit tyto předsudky a vede k\nrobustnější měření schopnosti modelu.', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut kielimallit ovat viime aikoina osoittaneet, että kielimallinnustavoitetta hyödyntävä suurten korpusten harjoittelu mahdollistaa muutaman ja nollakuvan kyvyn erilaisissa NLP-tehtävissä, mukaan lukien järkeviä päättelytehtäviä. Tämä saavutetaan käyttämällä tekstin vuorovaikutusta mallin kanssa, yleensä esittämällä tehtävä luonnollisen kielen tekstin täydennysongelmana. Vaikka kielimallin todennäköisyyksien käyttäminen tehtäväkohtaisten pisteiden saamiseen on ollut yleisesti hyödyllistä, se vaatii usein tehtäväkohtaista heuristiikkaa, kuten pituuden normalisointia tai todennäköisyyskalibrointia. Tässä työssä pohdimme kysymyksen vastausmuotoa, jossa meidän täytyy valita joukko (vapaamuotoisia) tekstivalintoja määrittelemättömillä pituuksilla kontekstissa. Esitämme ALC:n (Answer-Level Calibration), jossa pääehdotuksemme on mallintaa kontekstista riippumattomat harhat valinnan todennäköisyyden suhteen ilman siihen liittyvää kontekstia ja poistaa se myöhemmin käyttämällä valvomatonta arviota samankaltaisuudesta koko kontekstin kanssa. Osoitamme, että valvomaton vastaustason kalibrointi paranee johdonmukaisesti tai kilpailee peruslinjojen kanssa käyttämällä vakioarviointimittareita erilaisissa tehtävissä, kuten järkeviä päättelytehtäviä. Lisäksi osoitamme, että suositut aineistot saattavat suosia malleja, jotka ovat taipuvaisia kohti helppoja vihjeitä, jotka ovat saatavilla kontekstista riippumatta. Analysoimme tällaiset harhat käyttämällä siihen liittyvää F1-pistettä. Analyysimme osoittaa, että vastaustason kalibrointi pystyy poistamaan tällaiset harhat ja johtaa\nmallikapasiteetin tarkempi mittaaminen.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש הראו לאחרונה שאימונים על גופורה גדולה בשימוש במטרה של דוגמני שפה מאפשרים לירות מעט ואפס על מגוון משימות NLP, כולל משימות הגיון משותפות. זה ניתן להשיג באמצעות אינטראקציות טקסטית עם המודל, בדרך כלל על ידי העמדה של המשימה כבעיה של השפה הטבעית להשלים טקסט טקסט. בעוד השימוש בסבירות של מודל שפה כדי להשיג נקודות מסויימות למשימה היה בערך כלל שימושי, זה לעתים קרובות דורש הוריסטיקה מסויימת למשימה כמו נורמליזציה של אורך, או קליבריה של הסבירות. בעבודה הזאת, אנו שוקלים את פורמט השאלה שעובר על השאלה, היכן שאנחנו צריכים לבחור מגבול של (צורה חופשית) בחירות טקסטיות של ארוכות לא מוגדרות בהתחשב בקשר. אנו מציגים ALC (קליברציה רמת תשובה), שבו ההצעה העיקרית שלנו היא לדוגמא צדדים עצמאיים בקשר לקונקסט במונחים של הסבירות לבחירה ללא הקשר הקשור ולאחר מכן להסיר אותו באמצעות הערכה לא מושגת של דמיון עם הקונקסט המלא. אנו מראים כי הקליברציה שלנו רמת תשובה ללא השגחה משתפרת באופן קבוע מעל או היא תחרותית עם קווי בסיס בשימוש מטריות הערכה סטנדרטיות על מגוון משימות כולל משימות הגיון משותפים. נוסף מזה, אנחנו מראים כי קבוצות נתונים פופולריים פוטנציאליים מעדיפים דוגמנים מועמדים אל סימנים קלים אשר זמינים ללא קשר. אנו מנתחים תמונות כאלה באמצעות נקודת F1 מחוברת. הניתוח שלנו מצביע על כך שקליברציה ברמה של תשובה מסוגלת להסיר חיזוקים כאלה ומוביל\nמידה חזקה יותר של יכולת מודל.', 'sk': 'Predhodno usposobljeni jezikovni modeli so nedavno pokazali, da usposabljanje na velikih korpusih z uporabo cilja jezikovnega modeliranja omogoča zmogljivosti nekaj posnetkov in nič posnetkov pri različnih nalogah NLP, vključno s splošnim razmišljanjem. To dosežemo z uporabo besedilnih interakcij z modelom, običajno tako, da nalogo postavimo kot problem dokončanja besedila v naravnem jeziku. Čeprav je bila uporaba verjetnosti jezikovnega modela za pridobivanje specifičnih rezultatov opravila na splošno koristna, pogosto zahteva specifično heuristiko opravila, kot je normalizacija dolžine ali kalibracija verjetnosti. V tem delu obravnavamo obliko odgovora na vprašanja, kjer moramo izbirati med naborom (prostovoljnih) besedilnih izbir nedoločenih dolžin glede na kontekst. Predstavljamo ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), kjer je naš glavni predlog modelirati kontekstno neodvisne pristranskosti v smislu verjetnosti izbire brez povezanega konteksta in jo nato odstraniti z uporabo nenadzorovane ocene podobnosti s celotnim kontekstom. Pokazujemo, da se naša nenadzorovana kalibracija ravni odgovorov dosledno izboljšuje nad osnovnimi vrednostmi ali je konkurenčna z uporabo standardnih meritev ocenjevanja pri različnih nalogah, vključno z opravili razumnega razmišljanja. Poleg tega pokažemo, da priljubljeni nabori podatkov potencialno dajejo prednost modelom, pristranskim k preprostim namigom, ki so na voljo neodvisno od konteksta. Takšne pristranskosti analiziramo z uporabo povezanega rezultata F1. Naša analiza kaže, da kalibracija ravni odgovorov lahko odstrani takšne pristranskosti in vodi do\nrobustnejše merjenje zmogljivosti modela.', 'ha': "Immunai na zaman-tsari na harshen farko sun nuna mafarin a kan makampuni mai girma da ya yi amfani da abun-motsi na harshen, yana iya amfani da abincin masu sauya da haske-shot kan taskõkin NLP masu yawa, da kuma aikin masu fasahan aiki na komasant. An cika wannan da ke amfani da interaction ɗin matsayi da shirin ayuka, ko da yaushe, ana ƙara aikin ka zama wata mataimaki ga cikakki matsayin na asali. A lokacin da za'a yi amfani da misãlai na harshe wa'urar ya kamata wa'adin score masu ƙayyade wa aikin, yana da amfani da shi a jumla'a, ana buƙata ana da wasu heuristics masu ƙayyade kamar daidaita shida tsawo, ko mai kalarin mai yiwuwa. Daga wannan aikin, munã ƙayyade tsarin mai karɓa wa tambaya, inda za mu iya zãɓi daga wasu zaɓen shiryoyin matsayi na tsari (da ba'a rasa ba) da lissafa ba da wani context. We present ALC (Answer-Level Calibration), where our main suggestion is to model context-independent biases in terms of the probability of a choice without the associated context and to subsequently remove it using an unsupervised estimate of similarity with the full context.  Tuna nũna cewa kalarin-leveli da ba'a tsare ba, yana ƙara a bada ko yana ta yi ƙunci da misalin bango, yana amfani da metric masu ƙidãya a kan aikin da aka tsare su a cikin wasu aikin da ke samu'a da aikin masu fasahan a kommisan. Furan, Muke nuna cewa misãlai masu ƙaranci na samun mutane masu iya amfani da misãlai wanda aka haramta zuwa miscufi masu sauƙi waɗanda ke da buƙata, ba da amfani ba daga mazaɓa. Ana yi anayya ga wannan taƙaluma da ke amfani da wani shirin F1-score. AnalyyinMu yana nũna cewa lissafar-daraja na iya iya tafiyar da wannan tababar kuma yana madaidaita zuwa a\nma'anar tamkar misalin.", 'jv': 'model sing wis lidheng, peduli aplikasi ngono akeh bantuan karo perusahaan banget nggambar tarjamahan iki bakal ono nggawe gerasane textual karo model, sadurunge iso nggawe task nganggo perusahaan langgambar textual. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang cara-cara iki, kita isih ndadekake perspekpun format atik dadi, ning awak dhéwé butuh tentang kanggo sampek (perusahaan-perusahaan) cara-perusahaan langgar sing nguasai tanggap. Awak dhéwé nambah AlC Awak dhéwé ngerasah tanggal-kalibrasi sing gak nggawe gerakan luwih-luwih dumaten ngono nggawe barang-luwih kuwi kesempatan karo perusahaan sistem sing gak nggawe barang samihan karo akeh operasi sing paling maneh dumateng. Daftar, kita ngomong nik, populer dataset kang supaya model biasane kang sampeyan gampang Genjer Ndeleksyon anyar mungkin ngerti ajeng kelibrasyon apa-kenu iso nggowo kalibrasyon iki dadi, lan dumadhi iki\nduluran kanggo kalagayang kapasituran model.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག འདི་ནི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་ཡུལ་གྱི་འབྲེལ་ས་ཡི་གེའི་སྤྱོད་སྤྱད་ནས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དེ་ལྟར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡིན་པ། སྐད ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་ལན་གསལ་བའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དགོས་པ་དེ་འདྲ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ALC(Answer-Level Calibration)འདི་བསམ་འཆར་ང་ཚོའི་རྩ་བའི་བསམ We show that our unsupervised answer-level calibration  consistently improves over or is competitive with baselines using standard evaluation metrics on a variety of tasks including commonsense reasoning tasks. འོན་ཀྱང་། མི་མང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱིས་ཕན་ཆེར་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་མི་སྟོང་ ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་བའི་F1 རིམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་དབྱིབས་གང་འདྲ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་པར་རིམ་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་འདིའི་གནད་སྲིད་འདི་བསུབ་པར་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་དང་།\nསྐྱེས་ཚད་འདི་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Generated Knowledge Prompting for Commonsense Reasoning', 'ar': 'تعلم متى تترجم لتدفق الكلام', 'pt': 'Aprendendo quando traduzir para streaming de fala', 'fr': 'Apprendre quand traduire pour la diffusion vocale', 'es': 'Aprender cuándo traducir para streaming de voz', 'ja': 'ストリーミングスピーチのために翻訳するタイミングを学ぶ', 'hi': 'सीखना जब स्ट्रीमिंग भाषण के लिए अनुवाद करने के लिए', 'ru': 'Учимся, когда переводить для потоковой речи', 'zh': '学何时译流式语音', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Cathain le hAistriú le haghaidh Sruthú Cainte', 'ka': 'სწავლება როდესაც სიტყვას გადაწყენება', 'el': 'Μάθετε πότε να μεταφράσετε για ροή ομιλίας', 'hu': 'A fordítás megtanulása a streameléshez', 'it': 'Imparare quando tradurre per Streaming Speech', 'kk': 'Қайта аудару үшін оқыту', 'lt': 'Mokymasis versti kalbą', 'mt': 'It-Tagħlim Meta jrid jittraduċi għal kelma li tixxerred', 'ms': 'Belajar Bila Terjemahkan untuk Ucapan Sempadan', 'mk': 'Научи кога да преведеш за тековен говор', 'no': 'Læring når å omsetja for streking', 'pl': 'Nauka się, kiedy tłumaczyć dla streamingu mowy', 'ml': 'സ്ട്രീമിംഗ് സംസാരം പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d എപ്പോള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Улаан яриаг хэзээ хөгжүүлэхийг сурах', 'ro': 'Învățați când să traduceți pentru difuzarea discursului', 'sr': 'Naučenje kada prevoditi za proizvodnju govora', 'so': 'Baritaanka marka lagu turjumo hadalka xoogga leh', 'si': 'ස්ට්\u200dරීම් කතාවට පරිවර්තන කවදාවත් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'sv': 'Lär dig när du ska översätta för streamingtal', 'ta': 'பேச்சின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு போகும் போது கற்றுக்கொள்கிறது', 'ur': 'سیکھ رہی ہے کہ کلام کی تعبیر کب کرنا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học cách dịch cho phát đạt', 'bg': 'Научете кога да превеждате за стрийминг на речта', 'nl': 'Leren wanneer te vertalen voor streaming spraak', 'hr': 'Naučenje kada prevoditi za proizvodnju govora', 'da': 'Lære hvornår man skal oversætte til streaming tale', 'de': 'Lernen, wann man für Streaming-Sprache übersetzen muss', 'sw': 'Kujifunza ni lini kutafsiri kwa ajili ya Mazungumzo ya Mitandao', 'id': 'Belajar Kapan untuk Terjemahkan untuk Bicara Beralih', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن زمانی برای ترجمه کردن سخنرانی', 'ko': '흐르는 음성을 언제 번역하는지 배우다', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'sq': 'Mësoni kur të përktheheni për fjalimin e rrjedhshëm', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk üçin haçan terjime edilmeli öwrenmek', 'af': 'Leer wanneer om te vertaal vir stroom spreek', 'az': 'S톛f톛r 칲칞칲n n톛 vaxt terc칲m톛 edil톛c톛yini 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'hy': 'Սովորել, երբ թարգմանել հեռացող ելույթ', 'bn': 'স্ট্রিমিং ভাষার জন্য অনুবাদ করার সময় শিখা হবে', 'ca': 'Aprendre quan traduir per un discurs en flux', 'cs': 'Učení se, kdy překládat pro streamování řeči', 'fi': 'Oppiminen, milloin kääntää puheen suoratoistoa varten', 'et': 'Õppimine, millal voogkõne jaoks tõlkida', 'bs': 'Naučenje kada prevoditi za proizvodnju govora', 'he': 'ללמוד מתי לתרגם לשיחה זרימת', 'sk': 'Učenje, kdaj prevajati za pretakanje govora', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Streaming སྒྲ་བརྗོད་ལ་ཆ་གཏོང་ནི་ག་དུས་གཏོང་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'It remains an open question whether incorporating external knowledge benefits commonsense reasoning while maintaining the flexibility of pretrained sequence models To investigate this question we develop generated knowledge prompting which consists of generating knowledge from a language model then providing the knowledge as additional input when answering a question Our method does not require task specific supervision for knowledge integration or access to a structured knowledge base yet it improves performance of large scale state of the art models on four commonsense reasoning tasks achieving state of the art results on numerical commonsense NumerSense general commonsense CommonsenseQA 2.0 and scientific commonsense QASC benchmarks Generated knowledge prompting highlights large scale language models as flexible sources of external knowledge for improving commonsense reasoning Our code is available at \\urlgithub.com/liujch1998/GKP\n      ', 'ar': 'كيف تجد اللحظات المناسبة لتوليد ترجمة جزئية للجملة في ظل إدخال الكلام المتدفق؟ غالبًا ما تؤدي الأساليب الحالية في الانتظار والترجمة لمدة محددة إلى كسر الوحدات الصوتية في الكلام ، نظرًا لأن الحدود بين الوحدات الصوتية في الكلام ليست متساوية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح MoSST ، طريقة بسيطة لكنها فعالة لترجمة محتوى الكلام المتدفق. بالنظر إلى تسلسل الكلام الطويل عادةً ، نقوم بتطوير وحدة تجزئة رتيبة فعالة داخل نموذج وحدة فك التشفير لتجميع المعلومات الصوتية بشكل متزايد واكتشاف حدود وحدة الكلام المناسبة للإدخال في مهمة ترجمة الكلام. تُظهر التجارب على اتجاهات الترجمة المتعددة لمجموعة بيانات MuST-C أن الطريقة \\ تتفوق في الأداء على الأساليب الحالية وتحقق أفضل مفاضلة بين جودة الترجمة (BLEU) ووقت الاستجابة. الكود الخاص بنا متاح على https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'pt': 'Como encontrar os momentos adequados para gerar a tradução parcial de frases com uma entrada de fala em streaming? As abordagens existentes de espera e tradução por uma duração fixa muitas vezes quebram as unidades acústicas na fala, uma vez que os limites entre as unidades acústicas na fala não são uniformes. Neste artigo, propomos o MoSST, um método simples e eficaz para traduzir conteúdo de fala em streaming. Dada uma sequência de fala geralmente longa, desenvolvemos um módulo de segmentação monotônica eficiente dentro de um modelo codificador-decodificador para acumular informações acústicas de forma incremental e detectar limites de unidade de fala adequados para a entrada na tarefa de tradução de fala. Experimentos em várias direções de tradução do conjunto de dados MuST-C mostram que \\method supera os métodos existentes e alcança o melhor compromisso entre qualidade de tradução (BLEU) e latência. Nosso código está disponível em https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'es': '¿Cómo encontrar los momentos adecuados para generar una traducción parcial de oraciones dada una entrada de voz en streaming? Los enfoques existentes de esperar y traducir durante una duración fija a menudo rompen las unidades acústicas en el habla, ya que los límites entre las unidades acústicas en el habla no son uniformes. En este artículo, proponemos MosSt, un método simple pero eficaz para traducir contenido de voz en streaming. Dada una secuencia de voz generalmente larga, desarrollamos un módulo de segmentación monótona eficiente dentro de un modelo de codificador-decodificador para acumular información acústica de forma incremental y detectar los límites adecuados de la unidad de voz para la entrada en la tarea de traducción de voz. Los experimentos en múltiples direcciones de traducción del conjunto de datos MUST-c muestran que\\ method supera a los métodos existentes y logra el mejor equilibrio entre la calidad de la traducción (BLEU) y la latencia. Nuestro código está disponible en https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'fr': "Comment trouver les bons moments pour générer une traduction de phrase partielle avec une entrée vocale en streaming\xa0? Les approches existantes d'attente et de traduction pendant une durée fixe cassent souvent les unités acoustiques de la parole, puisque les frontières entre les unités acoustiques dans la parole ne sont pas uniformes. Dans cet article, nous proposons MoSST, une méthode simple mais efficace pour traduire du contenu vocal en streaming. Compte tenu d'une séquence vocale généralement longue, nous développons un module de segmentation monotone efficace à l'intérieur d'un modèle encodeur-décodeur pour accumuler des informations acoustiques de manière incrémentielle et détecter les limites des unités vocales appropriées pour l'entrée dans la tâche de traduction vocale. Des expériences sur plusieurs directions de traduction du jeu de données MUST-C montrent que\xa0\\ method surpasse les méthodes existantes et réalise le meilleur compromis entre qualité de traduction (BLEU) et latence. Notre code est disponible sur https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'zh': '安得时来成句译,与定流语音输入? 凡待译之法,破语音之声学,声学不均也。 本文发MoSST,译语流媒体略而有效者也。 给定一常声序,于编码器 - 解码器模中开一效单调分模块,以增量积声学信息,并检译事中正音单元界。 MuST-C 数集多方实验明,\\method 优于今法,并于译质 (BLEU) 迟延之间最为权衡。 吾代码可在 https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst。', 'hi': 'स्ट्रीमिंग भाषण इनपुट को देखते हुए आंशिक वाक्य अनुवाद उत्पन्न करने के लिए उचित क्षणों को कैसे ढूंढें? एक निश्चित अवधि के लिए प्रतीक्षा-और-अनुवाद करने वाले मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण अक्सर भाषण में ध्वनिक इकाइयों को तोड़ते हैं, क्योंकि भाषण में ध्वनिक इकाइयों के बीच की सीमाएं भी नहीं हैं। इस पेपर में, हम MoSST का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो स्ट्रीमिंग भाषण सामग्री का अनुवाद करने के लिए एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी तरीका है। आमतौर पर लंबे भाषण अनुक्रम को देखते हुए, हम ध्वनिक जानकारी को वृद्धिशील रूप से जमा करने और भाषण अनुवाद कार्य में इनपुट के लिए उचित भाषण इकाई सीमाओं का पता लगाने के लिए एक एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल के अंदर एक कुशल मोनोटोनिक विभाजन मॉड्यूल विकसित करते हैं। MuST-C डेटासेट के एकाधिक अनुवाद दिशाओं पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि \\method मौजूदा तरीकों को मात देता है और अनुवाद गुणवत्ता (BLEU) और विलंबता के बीच सबसे अच्छा ट्रेड-ऑफ प्राप्त करता है। हमारा कोड https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ja': 'ストリーミング音声入力で部分的な文章翻訳を生成するための適切な瞬間を見つける方法は?既存のアプローチは、音声における音響単位の境界が均一ではないため、一定の持続時間で待機および翻訳することは、音声における音響単位を壊すことが多い。本稿では、ストリーミング音声コンテンツを翻訳するためのシンプルで効果的な方法であるMoSSTを提案する。通常長い音声シーケンスを考慮して、私たちはエンコーダ－デコーダモデル内で効率的な単調セグメンテーションモジュールを開発し、音響情報を増分的に蓄積し、音声翻訳タスクの入力のための適切な音声ユニット境界を検出します。MuST - Cデータセットの複数の翻訳方向の実験では、\\メソッドは既存の方法を上回り、翻訳品質（ BLEU ）とレイテンシーの間の最良のトレードオフを達成することが示されています。コードはhttps://github.com/dqqcasia/mosstから入手できます。', 'ru': 'Как найти подходящие моменты для генерации частичного перевода предложения при потоковом вводе речи? Существующие подходы ожидания и перевода на фиксированную длительность часто ломают акустические единицы в речи, поскольку границы между акустическими единицами в речи не равны. В этой статье мы предлагаем MoSST, простой, но эффективный метод перевода потокового речевого контента. Учитывая обычно длинную речевую последовательность, мы разрабатываем эффективный модуль монотонной сегментации внутри модели кодировщик-декодер для пошагового накопления акустической информации и обнаружения соответствующих границ речевых блоков для ввода в задачу перевода речи. Эксперименты с несколькими направлениями трансляции набора данных MuST-C показывают, что \\method превосходит существующие методы и достигает наилучшего компромисса между качеством трансляции (BLEU) и задержкой. Наш код доступен по адресу https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ga': 'Conas tráthanna cearta a aimsiú chun aistriúchán páirt-abairte a ghiniúint nuair a chuirtear ionchur cainte sruthaithe? Is minic a bhriseann cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana féin ag fanacht agus ag aistriú ar feadh tréimhse seasta na haonaid fhuaimiúla sa chaint, ós rud é nach bhfuil na teorainneacha idir aonaid fhuaimiúla sa chaint cothrom. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid MoSST, modh simplí ach éifeachtach chun ábhar sruthaithe cainte a aistriú. Mar gheall ar sheicheamh cainte fada de ghnáth, forbraímid modúl deighilte monotonach éifeachtach taobh istigh de shamhail ionchódóra-díchódóra chun faisnéis fhuaimiúil a charnadh go hincriminteach agus chun teorainneacha aonaid cainte cearta a bhrath don ionchur sa tasc aistriúcháin cainte. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar threoracha iolracha aistriúcháin ar thacar sonraí MST-C go sáraíonn an modh \\ na modhanna atá ann cheana féin agus go mbaineann sé amach an comhbhabhtáil is fearr idir cáilíocht aistriúcháin (BLEU) agus foighne. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ka': 'როგორ მოიძებნა საჭირო მომენტები, როგორ განვითარება ფართო სიტყვების გაგრძელებაზე? არსებობს დავარწმუნეთ და დარწმუნეთ კოსტიკური ერთეულებების განმავლობაში, რადგან კოსტიკური ერთეულებების განმავლობაში კოსტიკური ერთეულებების განმავლობაში არსებობს. ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ მოძლევთ MoSST-ს, ერთადერთი მაგრამ ეფექტიური პროცემი სიტყვების შემდგომარებისთვის გადაწყვანა. ჩვენ განვითარებით დიდი სიტყვების შემდეგ ეფექტიური მონოტონიული სექმენტირების მოდულის განვითარებით, რომელიც კოდერირების მოდელში აკუსტიული ინფორმაციის ინტერმენტულად კომულაცია და დავიწყებთ სწორ MuST- C მონაცემების მონაცემების მრავალური დარგზავნის განცემებების გამოცემებები ჩვენებს, რომ\\ მედიოდი უფრო გავაკეთებს სექსემის მედიოდის და უფრო მსგავსი გარგზავ ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'el': 'Πώς να βρείτε τις κατάλληλες στιγμές για να δημιουργήσετε μερική μετάφραση προτάσεων με μια ροή ομιλίας εισόδου; Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις αναμονής-μετάφρασης για καθορισμένη διάρκεια συχνά σπάνε τις ακουστικές μονάδες στην ομιλία, δεδομένου ότι τα όρια μεταξύ ακουστικών μονάδων στην ομιλία δεν είναι ίσα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική μέθοδο για τη μετάφραση περιεχομένου ομιλίας ροής. Δεδομένου μιας συνήθως μακράς ακολουθίας ομιλίας, αναπτύσσουμε μια αποδοτική ενότητα μονοτονικής τμηματοποίησης μέσα σε ένα μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για τη συσσώρευση ακουστικών πληροφοριών βαθμιαία και τον εντοπισμό κατάλληλων ορίων μονάδας ομιλίας για την εισαγωγή στην εργασία μετάφρασης ομιλίας. Τα πειράματα σε πολλαπλές κατευθύνσεις μετάφρασης του συνόλου δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η \\μέθοδος ξεπερνά τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους και επιτυγχάνει το καλύτερο συμβιβασμό μεταξύ ποιότητας μετάφρασης (BLEU) και καθυστέρησης. Ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'hu': 'Hogyan találjuk meg a megfelelő pillanatokat a részleges mondatfordítás generálására egy streamelt beszédbevitel mellett? A meglévő, rögzített időtartamra váró és fordító megközelítések gyakran megszakítják a beszéd akusztikus egységeit, mivel a beszéd akusztikus egységei közötti határok nem egyenletesek. Ebben a tanulmányban a MoSST-t javasoljuk, amely egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony módszer a beszédtartalom streamelésére. Az általában hosszú beszédsorozat miatt egy hatékony monoton szegmentációs modult fejlesztünk ki egy kódoló-dekóder modellben, amely fokozatosan felhalmozza az akusztikus információkat és észleli a beszédfordítási feladat bemeneti egységeinek határait. A MuST-C adatkészlet több fordítási irányán végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a \\method túllépi a meglévő módszereket, és a lehető legjobb kompromisszumot biztosítja a fordítási minőség (BLEU) és a késleltetés között. A kódunk elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'it': "Come trovare i momenti giusti per generare una traduzione parziale delle frasi con un input vocale in streaming? Gli approcci esistenti in attesa e traduzione per una durata fissa spesso rompono le unità acustiche nel discorso, poiché i confini tra le unità acustiche nel discorso non sono pari. In questo articolo proponiamo MoSST, un metodo semplice ma efficace per tradurre contenuti vocali in streaming. Data una sequenza vocale solitamente lunga, sviluppiamo un efficiente modulo di segmentazione monotonica all'interno di un modello encoder-decoder per accumulare informazioni acustiche incrementalmente e rilevare i limiti corretti delle unità vocali per l'input nel compito di traduzione vocale. Esperimenti su più direzioni di traduzione del dataset MuST-C mostrano che \\method supera i metodi esistenti e raggiunge il miglior compromesso tra qualità di traduzione (BLEU) e latenza. Il nostro codice è disponibile all'indirizzo https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'kk': 'Жіберілген сөздің бөлігін аудару үшін дұрыс уақыттар қалай табылады? Бар жағдайда күту және аудару тұрақты ұзақтығында акустикалық бірліктерді сөйлеу үшін күту және аудару жағдайдары көбірек айырмашылық бірліктерінің шектері жоқ себебі. Бұл қағазда, біз MoSST дегенді қарапайым әлі әсер ететін әдістерді сөйлеу мазмұнын аударуға арналады. Кәдімгі ұзын сөйлеу ретінде, біз кодер- декодер үлгісінің ішінде эффективні монотонны сегментациялау модулін құрамыз. Акустикалық мәліметті көптеген және сөйлеу бірлігінің шектерін сөйлеу тапсырм MuST- C деректер қорларының бірнеше аудармалар бағыттарының тәжірибесі бар әдістерінен\\ әдіс орындалып, аудармалар сапасы (BLEU) мен кеңейту арасындағы ең жақсы тәжірибесін жеткізеді Біздің кодмыз бар https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ms': 'How to find proper moments to generate partial sentence translation given a streaming speech input?  Existing approaches waiting-and-translating for a fixed duration often break the acoustic units in speech, since the boundaries between acoustic units in speech are not even.  In this paper, we propose MoSST, a simple yet effective method for translating streaming speech content.  Mengingat jujukan ucapan biasanya panjang, kami mengembangkan modul segmen monotonik efisien dalam model pengekod-dekoder untuk mengumpulkan maklumat akustik secara bertambah dan mengesan sempadan unit ucapan yang betul untuk input dalam tugas terjemahan ucapan. Eksperimen pada arah terjemahan berbilang bagi set data MuST- C menunjukkan bahawa \\kaedah melampaui kaedah sedia ada dan mencapai perdagangan terbaik antara kualiti terjemahan (BLEU) dan kelemahan. Kod kita tersedia di https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ml': 'സ്ട്രീമിങ്ങ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് നല്\u200dകിയിരിക്കുന്ന പാതിക വാക്കിന്റെ വാക്കുകള ഒരു നിശ്ചിത കാലം കാത്തിരിക്കുന്നതിനും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുമായി നിലവിലുള്ള അടുത്തുവരുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മോഎസ്റ്റിയെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, സ്ട്രീമിങ്ങ് സ്ട്രീമിങ്ങ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിഭവങ സാധാരണയായൊരു നീണ്ട സംസാര സംവാക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ക്രമീകരണം കൊണ്ട്, വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നത @ info നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'mt': 'Kif issib mumenti xierqa biex tiġġenera traduzzjoni parzjali tas-sentenza mogħtija input ta’ diskors streaming? Existing approaches waiting-and-translating for a fixed duration often break the acoustic units in speech, since the boundaries between acoustic units in speech are not even.  In this paper, we propose MoSST, a simple yet effective method for translating streaming speech content.  Given a usually long speech sequence, we develop an efficient monotonic segmentation module inside an encoder-decoder model to accumulate acoustic information incrementally and detect proper speech unit boundaries for the input in speech translation task.  Experiments on multiple translation directions of the MuST-C dataset show that \\method outperforms existing methods and achieves the best trade-off between translation quality (BLEU) and latency.  Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'mn': 'Яаж нэг хэсэг өгүүлбэрийг бий болгох зөв мөчүүдийг олох вэ? Эдгээр арга барилгууд нь тодорхой цаг хугацаанд хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой болсон. Учир нь ярианы акустик нэгжийн хоорондын хязгаар ч байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид MoSST-г илтгэлийн сорилтуудыг орлуулахын тулд энгийн ч үр дүнтэй арга зам гэж санал болно. Ихэвчлэн урт ярианы дарааллаар бид коддогч загварын дотор бүтээмжтэй модуль хөгжүүлж, акустик мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлж, ярианы орнуудын орнуудын тулд зөв ярианы нэгжээний хязгаарыг олох боломжтой болгодог. МАСТ-С өгөгдлийн сангийн олон хэлбэрийн орчуулалтын туршилтын туршилт нь \\метод оршиж буй арга замыг дамжуулж, орчуулалтын сайн сайн худалдаа (BLEU) болон сүүлийн үеийн хоорондын хамгийн сайн худалдаа гар Бидний код нь https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'pl': 'Jak znaleźć odpowiednie momenty do wygenerowania częściowego tłumaczenia zdania przy użyciu strumieniowego wejścia mowy? Istniejące podejścia oczekiwania i tłumaczenia przez określony czas czasu często łamią jednostki akustyczne w mowie, ponieważ granice między jednostkami akustycznymi w mowie nie są równe. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy MoSST, prostą, ale skuteczną metodę tłumaczenia strumieniowej treści mowy. Biorąc pod uwagę zwykle długą sekwencję mowy, opracowujemy wydajny monotoniczny moduł segmentacji wewnątrz modelu kodera-dekodera, aby przyrostowo gromadzić informacje akustyczne i wykrywać właściwe granice jednostek mowy dla wejścia w zadaniu tłumaczenia mowy. Eksperymenty na wielu kierunkach tłumaczenia zestawu danych MuST-C pokazują, że \\method przewyższa istniejące metody i osiąga najlepszy kompromis między jakością tłumaczenia (BLEU) a opóźnieniem. Nasz kod jest dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'no': 'Korleis du finn rette øyeblikk for å laga delvis setjingsverktøyring gjeve ein stremmingstaleinndata? Det eksisterande tilnærmingane for venting og omsetjing for ein fast tid ofte bryt akustiske einingar i tale, sidan grensene mellom akustiske einingar i tale er ikkje engang. I denne papiret foreslår vi MoSST ein enkel, men effektiv metode for å oversette språk-innhaldet i straumen. Gjennomsikt vanlegvis ei lang talesekvens, utviklar vi eit effektivt monotonisk segmentasjonsmodul i eit koderedekodermodell for å akumulera akustiske informasjon aukande og oppdaga rette taleeiningsgrenser for inndata i taleoversettelsoppgåva. Eksperimentar på fleire oversettelsretningar i datasettet MuST- C viser at\\ method utfører eksisterande metoder og oppnår den beste utviklinga mellom omsetjingskvaliteten (BLEU) og latens. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'lt': 'How to find proper moments to generate partial sentence translation given a streaming speech input?  Esami fiksuotos trukmės laukimo ir vertimo metodai dažnai pažeidžia garso vienetus kalboje, nes garso vienetų ribos netgi nėra. Šiame dokumente siūlome MoSST, paprastą, bet veiksmingą kalbos turinio transliavimo metodą. Given a usually long speech sequence, we develop an efficient monotonic segmentation module inside an encoder-decoder model to accumulate acoustic information incrementally and detect proper speech unit boundaries for the input in speech translation task.  Experiments on multiple translation directions of the MuST-C dataset show that \\method outperforms existing methods and achieves the best trade-off between translation quality (BLEU) and latency.  Mūsų kodas pateikiamas https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'mk': 'Како да се најдат соодветни моменти за генерирање делумен превод на реченици со влог на текст на говорот? Existing approaches waiting-and-translating for a fixed duration often break the acoustic units in speech, since the boundaries between acoustic units in speech are not even.  In this paper, we propose MoSST, a simple yet effective method for translating streaming speech content.  Со оглед на обичната долга говорна секвенца, развиваме ефикасен монотонски модул за сегментација во моделот на кодер-декодер за акумулирање акустички информации incrementally и детектирање на соодветни граници на единицата за говор за внесување во задачата за превод на говор. Experiments on multiple translation directions of the MuST-C dataset show that \\method outperforms existing methods and achieves the best trade-off between translation quality (BLEU) and latency.  Нашиот код е достапен на https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ro': 'Cum să găsești momente potrivite pentru a genera traducerea parțială a propoziției, dată fiind introducerea unui discurs streaming? Abordările existente care așteaptă și traduc pentru o durată fixă rup adesea unitățile acustice din vorbire, deoarece granițele dintre unitățile acustice din vorbire nu sunt egale. În această lucrare, propunem MoSST, o metodă simplă, dar eficientă pentru traducerea conținutului de difuzare a discursului. Având în vedere o secvență de vorbire de obicei lungă, dezvoltăm un modul de segmentare monotonică eficient în interiorul unui model codificator-decodor pentru a acumula informații acustice treptat și pentru a detecta limitele corespunzătoare ale unității de vorbire pentru intrarea în sarcina de traducere a vorbirii. Experimentele pe mai multe direcții de traducere ale setului de date MuST-C arată că \\method depășește metodele existente și obține cel mai bun compromis între calitatea traducerii (BLEU) și latență. Codul nostru este disponibil la https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'sr': 'Kako naći odgovarajuće trenutke da stvori delimični prevod rečenice s obzirom na ulaz govora? Postoje pristupi koji čekaju i prevode na određenu trajanju često prekidaju akustičke jedinice na govoru, jer granice između akustičkih jedinica na govoru nisu čak ni. U ovom papiru predlažemo MoSST, jednostavan, ali efikasan metod za prevod sadržaja govora. S obzirom na obično dugu sekvenciju govora, razvijamo efikasni monotonski segmentacijski modul unutar model a kodera-dekodera kako bi se povećavajući akustičke informacije i otkrili odgovarajuće granice govorne jedinice za ulazak u zadatak prevoda govora. Eksperimenti o višestrukim uputama prevođenja podataka MuST-C pokazuju da metod \\iznosi postojeće metode i postiže najbolju trgovinu između kvalitete prevođenja (BLEU) i latencije. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'si': 'කොහොමද ස්ට්\u200dරීම් කතාව ඇතුළත් වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න හොඳ වෙලාවක් හොයාගන්න? ස්ථිර වෙලාවක් වෙනුවෙන් බලාපොරොත්තු සඳහා ස්ථිර වෙලාවක් වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ විශා මේ පත්තරේ අපි MoSST එක සැලසුම් කරනවා, ස්ට්\u200dරිම් කතාව සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් පරිවර්තන කරන්න. සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ලොකු කතා පරීක්ෂණයක් විදිහට, අපි කතා පරීක්ෂණයේ ඇතුලට සම්පූර්ණ විදිහට සම්පූර්ණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත් MuST- C දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවේශය සඳහා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට \\ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශ විදිහට ප්\u200dරව අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන් https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'so': 'Sidee baad u heli kartaa waqtiyada saxda ah si aad u sameyso tarjumaadda qeyb ka mid ah, taasoo lagu soo qoray input ku qoran hadalka? Sida darteed xuduudaha ku dhaxaysa iskuulka afka, ma aha xittaa. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa MoSST, qaab fudud oo weli faa’iido leh oo turjumaya waxyaabaha ku qoran hadalka. Sida caadiga ah, sida caadiga ah, waxaynu horumarinaynaa noocyo sax ah oo qodolka ah, waxaana ka mid ah model qodcoder, si a an u soo ururiyo macluumaad aad u badan iyo in aad u ogaanno xuduudaha nooca hadalka oo saxda ah, taasoo ah noocyada ku qoran fasaxa. Imtixaanka ku saabsan hagitaanka turjumaadda ee MuST-C dataset waxay muujiyaan \\method outperforms existing methods and achieves the best trade-off between quality (BLEU) and latency. Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'sv': 'Hur hittar man rätt ögonblick för att generera partiell mening översättning med hjälp av en strömmande tal input? Befintliga metoder som väntar och översätter under en bestämd tid bryter ofta de akustiska enheterna i tal, eftersom gränserna mellan akustiska enheter i tal inte är jämna. I denna uppsats föreslår vi MoSST, en enkel men effektiv metod för att översätta strömmande talinnehåll. Med tanke på en vanligen lång talsekvens utvecklar vi en effektiv monoton segmenteringsmodul inuti en encoder-avkodarmodell för att ackumulera akustisk information stegvis och upptäcka lämpliga talsgränser för inmatningen i talöversättningsuppgiften. Experiment på flera översättningsriktningar av MuST-C datauppsättningen visar att \\method överträffar befintliga metoder och uppnår den bästa avvägningen mellan översättningskvalitet (BLEU) och latens. Vår kod finns tillgänglig på https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ta': 'பாகமான வாக்கியம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை உருவாக்குவதற்கு எப்படி சரியான நிகழ்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும்? தற்போதைய நிலையான காலம் காத்திருக்கும் மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பிற்கு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு நெருங்குகிறது பெரும்பாலும் பேச்சில இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் MoSST, ஒரு எளிய ஆனாலும் பயனுள்ள முறைமையை மொழிபெயர்ப்பதற்கான முறைமை பொதுவாக நீண்ட பேச்சு விகிதம் கொண்டால், பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் உள்ள உள்ளீட்டிற்கு சரியான பேச்சு அலகு எல்லைகளை கண்டறிய ஒரு குறியீட்டாளர் குறியீட்டாளர் மா முஸ்ட்- C தரவுத்தளத்தின் பல மொழிபெயர்ப்பு திசைகளில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது \\முறைமையில் இருக்கும் முறைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது மற்றும் மொ எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ur': 'کس طرح مناسب لحظہ پیدا کریں گے جو حصہ جماعت کی ترجمہ پیدا کریں؟ ایک مقررہ مدت تک انتظار اور ترجمہ کے لئے موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود یونیٹوں کو کلام کے ذریعہ توڑ دیتے ہیں، کیونکہ بات میں آہستیک یونیٹوں کے درمیان حدود اصل نہیں ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم MoSST کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک ساده اور اثبات طریقہ کی ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے استریمینگ کلام کے منصوبات کے لئے۔ ہم ایک عمدہ طویل سخنرانی سفارش کے مطابق ایک اکوڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل کے درمیان ایک عمدہ منوٹنی سٹمنٹ موڈل ایجاد کرتے ہیں کہ آکوستیک معلومات کو اضافہ کریں اور سخنرانی ترجمہ کے کام کے لئے مناسب بات یونیٹ کے حدود تلاش کریں. MuST-C ڈیٹ سٹ کے بہت سی ترجمہ دکھانوں کی تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ \\metode موجود طریقوں سے زیادہ کامل ہوتا ہے اور ترجمہ کیفیت (BLEU) اور لٹینس کے درمیان بہترین ترجمہ آفاق کو پہنچاتا ہے. ہمارا کوڈ اس میں موجود ہے https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Mavjud vaqt davomida kutib turish va tarjima qilish usuli ko'p davomida acoustic birliklarni o'zgartiradi, chunki gapiradigan chegaralar xato emas. Bu hujjatda, biz MoSST, gapirish tarjimalarini tarjima qilish uchun oddiy va effektiv usuli. Kodlash usulida oddiy uzun gapirish tarkibi bilan biz tarjima qilish muvaffaqiyatsiz tuzishni foydalanishimiz mumkin. @ info Our code is available at  https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'vi': 'Làm thế nào để tìm đúng thời điểm để tạo ra bản dịch bằng một phần cho một bài phát âm? Các phương pháp chờ đợi và dịch theo thời gian cố định thường xuyên phá vỡ các đơn vị âm thanh trong ngôn ngữ, vì ranh giới giữa các đơn vị âm thanh trong ngôn ngữ không bằng nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị MOSST, một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để dịch nội dung giọng nói. Dựa vào một chuỗi ngôn ngữ thường lâu, chúng tôi phát triển một mô- đun phân tách độc đa hiệu quả trong một mô hình mã hóa để tích các thông tin âm tính tăng dần và phát hiện những ranh giới của đơn vị phát âm thích hợp cho việc nhập vào nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển giọng nói. Thí nghiệm về hướng dịch đa dạng của bộ dữ liệu MuST-C cho thấy • trình độ này vượt trội các phương pháp tồn tại và đạt được sự trao đổi tốt nhất giữa chất lượng dịch (bleU) và tiềm ẩn. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'bg': 'Как да намерим подходящи моменти за генериране на частичен превод на изречение при стрийминг вход на речта? Съществуващите подходи, които чакат и превеждат за фиксирана продължителност, често нарушават акустичните единици в речта, тъй като границите между акустичните единици в речта не са равни. В тази статия ние предлагаме прост, но ефективен метод за превод на стрийминг речно съдържание. Предвид обикновено дългата речна последователност, ние разработваме ефективен монотонен сегментационен модул вътре в кодер-декодер модел, за да натрупваме акустична информация постепенно и да откриваме подходящи граници на речните единици за въвеждане в задачата за превод на реч. Експерименти с множество направления на превод на набора от данни показват, че \\методът превъзхожда съществуващите методи и постига най-добрия компромис между качеството на превода и латентността. Нашият код е достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'nl': 'Hoe vind je de juiste momenten om gedeeltelijke zinsvertaling te genereren met een streaming spraak input? Bestaande benaderingen wachten en vertalen voor een vaste duur doorbreken vaak de akoestische eenheden in spraak, omdat de grenzen tussen akoestische eenheden in spraak niet gelijk zijn. In dit artikel stellen we MoSST voor, een eenvoudige maar effectieve methode voor het vertalen van streaming spraak content. Gezien een meestal lange spraaksequentie, ontwikkelen we een efficiënte monotone segmentatie module binnen een encoder-decoder model om akoestische informatie incrementel te accumuleren en de juiste grenzen van spraakeenheden te detecteren voor de invoer in spraakvertaaltaak. Experimenten met meerdere vertaalrichtingen van de MuST-C dataset tonen aan dat \\method bestaande methoden overtreft en de beste compromis bereikt tussen vertaalkwaliteit (BLEU) en latentie. Onze code is beschikbaar op https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'da': 'Hvordan finder man rigtige øjeblikke til at generere delvis sætningsoversættelse givet en streaming tale input? Eksisterende tilgange, der venter og oversætter i en fast varighed, bryder ofte de akustiske enheder i tale, da grænserne mellem akustiske enheder i tale ikke er lige. I denne artikel foreslår vi MoSST, en enkel, men effektiv metode til oversættelse af streaming taleindhold. I betragtning af en normalt lang talesekvens, udvikler vi et effektivt monotonisk segmenteringsmodul inde i en encoder-dekoder model til at akkumulere akustisk information trinvist og detektere korrekte taleenhedsgrænser for input i taleoversættelsesopgaven. Eksperimenter med flere oversættelsesretninger af MuST-C datasættet viser, at \\method overgår eksisterende metoder og opnår den bedste afvejning mellem oversættelseskvalitet (BLEU) og latens. Vores kode er tilgængelig på https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'hr': 'Kako naći odgovarajuće trenutke za stvaranje djelomičnog prevoda rečenice s obzirom na ulaz govora? Postoje pristupi koji čekaju i prevode na određenu trajanju često prekidaju akustičke jedinice na govoru, jer granice između akustičkih jedinica na govoru nisu čak ni. U ovom papiru predlažemo MoSST, jednostavan, ali efikasan način za prevod sadržaja govora. S obzirom na obično dugu sekvencu govora, razvijamo efikasni monotonski segmentacijski modul unutar model a kodera-dekodera kako bi se povećavajući akustičke informacije i otkrili odgovarajuće granice govorne jedinice za ulazak u prijevozni zadatak. Eksperimenti o višestrukim smjerovima prevođenja podataka MuST-C pokazuju da \\metod iznosi postojeće metode i postigne najbolju trgovinu između kvalitete prevođenja (BLEU) i latencije. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'de': 'Wie finde ich die richtigen Momente, um die Übersetzung eines Teilsatzes mit einem Streaming-Spracheingabe zu generieren? Bestehende Ansätze, die für eine bestimmte Dauer warten und übersetzen, brechen oft die akustischen Einheiten in der Sprache, da die Grenzen zwischen akustischen Einheiten in der Sprache nicht gleichmäßig sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir MoSST vor, eine einfache, aber effektive Methode zur Übersetzung von Streaming-Sprachinhalten. Angesichts einer meist langen Sprachsequenz entwickeln wir ein effizientes monotonisches Segmentierungsmodul innerhalb eines Encoder-Decoder-Modells, um akustische Informationen inkrementell zu akkumulieren und korrekte Grenzen der Spracheinheit für die Eingabe in Sprachübersetzungsaufgaben zu erkennen. Experimente an mehreren Übersetzungsrichtungen des MuST-C-Datensatzes zeigen, dass \\method bestehende Methoden übertrifft und den besten Kompromiss zwischen Übersetzungsqualität (BLEU) und Latenz erzielt. Unser Code ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'fa': 'چگونه لحظه\u200cهای مناسب برای تولید ترجمه\u200cی جمله\u200cای پاره\u200cای به عنوان ورودی سخنرانی روشن پیدا شود؟ نزدیک\u200cهایی که در حال انتظار و ترجمه\u200cکردن برای مدت ثابت، اغلب واحدهای آکوستیک را به سخنرانی می\u200cشکنند، زیرا مرزهای بین واحدهای آکوستیک در سخنرانی حتی نیستند. در این کاغذ، ما به MoSST پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک روش ساده و تاثیر برای ترجمه محتوای سخنرانی رانندگی. با توجه به یک ترکیب سخنرانی معمولاً طولانی، ما یک مولد جدا کردن monotonic موثرت را در یک مدل رمزی\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمزی برای جمع کردن اطلاعات آکوستیک به افزایش و کشف مرزهای واحد سخنرانی مناسب برای ورودی در کار ترکیب سخنرانی توسعه می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cهای روش\u200cهای تعداد ترجمه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای MuST- C نشان می\u200cدهند که\\ روش\\ روش\u200cهای موجود را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد و بهترین تجارت بین کیفیت ترجمه (BLEU) و latency را می\u200cرساند. کد ما در دسترس است https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ko': '유동식 음성 입력 상황에서 어떻게 적당한 시간을 찾아 일부 문장의 번역을 생성합니까?음성 중의 성학 단원 간의 경계가 고르지 않기 때문에 기존의 기다림과 번역 방법은 종종 음성 중의 성학 단원을 파괴할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 MosST, 간단하고 효과적인 흐르는 음성 내용 번역 방법을 제시했다.통상적으로 긴 음성 서열을 정하고 우리는 코딩기 모델에서 효율적인 단조로운 분할 모듈을 개발하여 음성 정보를 증량적으로 축적하고 음성 번역 임무의 입력에 적합한 음성 단원의 경계를 측정한다.MuST-C 데이터 세트의 여러 번역 방향에서의 실험은 \\method이 기존 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었고 번역 품질(BLEU)과 지연 사이에서 가장 좋은 절충을 실현했다.우리 코드는https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'tr': "Çaltylyk girişinde parça sözlem terjime etmek üçin nähili gowy minutlar tapylmaly? Durmuş bir wagt üçin garaş we terjime etmek üçin bar ýakynlaşylar köplenç akustik birimlerini çykarýar, çünki çykyş akustik birimler arasynda hatda däldir. Bu kagyzda, biz MoSST'i suýlaýarys. Çykyşyň maksadyny terjime etmek üçin ýeňil we täsirli bir yöntem. Adatça uzun bir çykyş sequenceri görä, biz koder-dekoder modeliniň içine etkinlik bir monotonik segmentasyon modulyny akustik maglumaty gaýşartmak üçin we çykyş terjime göreri üçin dogry çykyş ýerlerini tapylýarys. MuST-C veri taypişgäniň birnäçe terjime görnüşleri barlag çykaryp \\method bolan yönlerden çykarýar we terjime kwaliteti (BLEU) we latensiýa arasynda iň gowy terjime etmek üçin ýeterýär. Biziň kodymyz bar https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'af': "Hoe om regte oomblikke te vind om gedeeltelike setinge vertaling te genereer wat gegee is 'n stroom spraak invoer? Bestaande toegang tot wag en-vertaling vir 'n vaste duur afbreek die akustiese eenhede in spreek, omdat die grense tussen akustiese eenhede in spreek nie selfs is nie. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons MoSST, 'n eenvoudige nog effektief metode vir die vertaling van stroom spraak inhoud. Gien 'n gewoonlik lank spraak volgorde, ontwikkel ons 'n effektief monotoniese segmentasie module binne 'n enkoder-dekoder model om akustiese inligting inkrementeer te kry en regverdige spraak eenheid grense vir die invoer in spraak vertaling taak te kry. Eksperimente op veelvuldige vertalingsdireksies van die MuST- C datastel vertoon dat\\ metode bestaande metodes uitvoer en die beste verkoop- af tussen vertalingskwaliteit (BLEU) en latensie bereik. Ons kode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'am': 'የድምፅ ንግግር ግንኙነት በተሰጠው የክፍል ግንኙነት መፍጠር እንዴት ማግኘት ይችላል? የአሁኑ ዕድሜ ለመቆየት እና ለመዘርጋት የሚቀርበው የአካባቢው ብሔራዊ በንግግር ሲያቋርጥ፣ ምክንያቱም በቋንቋው መካከል ድንበር አይደሉም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም የንግግር ጽሑፎችን ለመትረፍ ቀላል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀም ረጅም የንግግር ግንኙነት በተደረገ ጊዜ በንግግር ትርጓሜ በሚተርጉም ስራ ውስጥ ጥሩ የሞቶኒካዊ ምርጫን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በMuST-C ዳታ-setet በብዙ ትርጉም መንገድ ላይ ፈተናዎች \\method outperforms existing methods and achieves the best trade-off between translation quality (BLEU) and latency. Our code is available at  https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'id': 'Bagaimana menemukan momen yang tepat untuk menghasilkan terjemahan kalimat parsial diberikan input pidato streaming? Pendekatan yang ada menunggu-dan-terjemahan untuk durasi tertentu sering menghancurkan unit akustik dalam pidato, karena batas antara unit akustik dalam pidato bahkan tidak. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan MoSST, metode sederhana namun efektif untuk menerjemahkan isi pidato streaming. Mengingat urutan pidato biasanya panjang, kami mengembangkan modul segmen monotonik efisien di dalam model dekoder-kode untuk mengumpulkan informasi akustik secara incremental dan mendeteksi batas unit pidato yang tepat untuk input dalam tugas terjemahan pidato. Eksperimen pada beberapa arah terjemahan dari set data MuST-C menunjukkan bahwa \\metode melampaui metode yang ada dan mencapai perdagangan terbaik antara kualitas terjemahan (BLEU) dan latensi. Kode kita tersedia di https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'sq': 'Si të gjesh momente të përshtatshme për të gjeneruar përkthimin e pjesshëm të fjalëve duke dhënë një hyrje të fluturimit të fjalimit? Existing approaches waiting-and-translating for a fixed duration often break the acoustic units in speech, since the boundaries between acoustic units in speech are not even.  In this paper, we propose MoSST, a simple yet effective method for translating streaming speech content.  Duke pasur parasysh një sekuencë të gjatë fjalimi, ne zhvillojmë një modul të efektshëm të segmentimit monotonik brenda një modeli kodues-dekoder për të akumuluar informacionin akustik në mënyrë graduale dhe për të zbuluar kufijtë e duhur të njësisë së fjalimit për hyrjen në detyrën e përkthimit të fjalimit. Eksperimentet mbi drejtimet e përkthimit të shumëfishtë të kompletit të të dhënave MuST-C tregojnë se \\metoda kalon metodat ekzistuese dhe arrin kompromisin më të mirë midis cilësisë së përkthimit (BLEU) dhe vonesës. Kodi ynë është në dispozicion në https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'az': "Sözlük girişi verilən parçacıq cümləni yaratmaq üçün nöqtələr necə tapılır? Bütün müəyyən bir müddət gözləmək və tercümləmək üçün müəyyən edilən yaxınlıqlar əksəriyyət akustik ünvanlarını sözlərdə qırır, çünki sözlərdə akustik ünvanların arasındakı sınır hətta deyildir. Bu kağızda, MoSST'i təbliğ edirik. Sözlük məlumatını streaming etmək üçün asanlıq, hətta etkili bir yol. Əvvəlcə uzun söz sıralığına görə, koder-dekoder model in in içində müvəffəqiyyətli monotonik segmentasiya modulu təşkil edirik ki, akustik məlumatları artıq toplayaq və sözlərin çevirilməsi işin ə uyğun söz birimi sınırlarını keşfetiz. MuST-C veri qutusunun çoxlu çeviri yöntemlərinin sınaqları göstərir ki\\ metod mevcut yöntemlərindən üstün olduğunu və çeviri kaliteli (BLEU) və latenci arasındakı ən yaxşı ticarət yolunu tapır. Bizim kodumuz https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'hy': 'How to find proper moments to generate partial sentence translation given a streaming speech input?  Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները, որոնք սպասում են և թարգմանում են հաստատուն տևողությամբ, հաճախ խախտում են խոսքի ձայնային միավորները, քանի որ խոսքի ձայնային միավորների միջև սահմանները նույնիսկ չեն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք MoSST-ը, մի պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ մեթոդ խոսքի պարունակության թարգմանելու համար: Սովորաբար երկար խոսքի հաջորդականությունը հաշվի առնելով, մենք զարգանում ենք մի արդյունավետ մոտոնիկ միատոնիկ սեգմերացիայի մոդել, որը կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելի մեջ է, որպեսզի միաժամանակ հավաքենք ձայնային տեղեկատվությունը և հայտնաբերենք խոսքի միավորի ճ ՄուՍԹ- C տվյալների համակարգի բազմաթիվ ուղղությունների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ \\մեթոդը գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները և հասնում է լավագույն հակամարտության թարգմանության որակի (ԲԼԵ) և լայնության միջև: Մեր կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'bn': 'কিভাবে স্ট্রিমিং ভাষণের ইনপুট দিয়ে অংশের বাক্যের অনুবাদ তৈরি করার জন্য যথাযথ মুহূর্তে খুঁজে বে বিদ্যমান সময়ের জন্য অপেক্ষা এবং অনুবাদের উপস্থিতির কাছে প্রায়শই বাক্যের সাথে প্রায় একাস্টিক ইউনিট ভাষায় ভেঙ্গে ফেলে, কারণ বাক্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মোএসটিকে প্রস্তাব করি, বাক স্ট্রিমিং বিষয়বস্তু অনুবাদ করার একটি সহজ কার্যকর উপায়। সাধারণত একটি দীর্ঘ বক্তৃতার সীমানা দিয়ে আমরা একটি কার্যকর মোনোটোনিক বিভাগ মডিউল তৈরি করি ভাষণের অনুবাদের কাজে ইনপুটের জন্য এক্কোডার-ডেকোডার মডেলের ভেতরে যাত মুস্টি-সি ডাটাসেটের বেশ কয়েকটি অনুবাদের দিকে পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে \\method outexecutes and অর্জন করে বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি এবং অনুবাদের মান (বিলিউ) এবং সম্প্রতি  Our code is available at  https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'bs': 'Kako naći odgovarajuće trenutke za stvaranje dijelovnog prevoda rečenice s obzirom na ulaz govora? Postoje pristupi koji čekaju i prevode na određenu trajanju često prekidaju akustičke jedinice na govoru, jer granice između akustičkih jedinica na govoru nisu čak ni. U ovom papiru predlažemo MoSST, jednostavan, ali efikasan metod prevoda sadržaja govora. S obzirom na obično dugu sekvencu govora, razvijamo efikasni monotonski segmentacijski modul unutar model a kodera-dekodera kako bi se povećavajući akustičke informacije i otkrili odgovarajuće granice govorne jedinice za ulazak u predvod govora. Eksperimenti o višestrukim uputama prevođenja podataka MuST-C pokazuju da \\metod iznosi postojeće metode i postiže najbolju trgovinu između kvalitete prevođenja (BLEU) i latencije. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ca': "Com trobar moments adequats per generar traducció parcial de frases amb una entrada de parla en flux? Els enfocaments existents d'espera i traducció durant una duració fixa sovint trenquen les unitats acústiques en la fala, ja que els límits entre unitats acústiques en la fala no són fins i tot. En aquest article, proposem MoSST, un mètode simple però efectiu per traduir el contingut de la xerrada de discurs. Tenint en compte una seqüència de vosaltres normalment llarga, desenvolupem un módul de segmentació monotònica eficient dins un model de codificador-decoder per acumular informació acústica incrementalment i detectar límits adequats de les unitats de vosaltres per a la entrada en la tasca de traducció de vosaltres. Els experiments en múltiples direccions de traducció del conjunt de dades MuST-C mostran que el mètode supera els mètodes existents i aconsegueix el millor compromís entre la qualitat de traducció (BLEU) i la latencia. El nostre codi està disponible en https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'cs': 'Jak najít správné okamžiky pro generování částečného překladu věty při streamování řečového vstupu? Stávající přístupy čekání a překládání po pevnou dobu často přerušují akustické jednotky v řeči, protože hranice mezi akustickými jednotkami v řeči nejsou rovné. V tomto článku navrhujeme MoSST, jednoduchou, ale efektivní metodu pro překlad streamovaného řečového obsahu. Vzhledem k obvykle dlouhé řečové sekvenci vyvíjíme efektivní monotonický segmentační modul uvnitř modelu kodéru-dekodéru pro inkrementální akumulaci akustických informací a detekci správných hranic řečových jednotek pro vstup v úkolu překladu řeči. Experimenty na více směrech překladu datové sady MuST-C ukazují, že \\method překonává existující metody a dosahuje nejlepšího kompromisu mezi kvalitou překladu (BLEU) a latencí. Náš kód je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'et': 'Kuidas leida sobivaid hetki, et genereerida osaline lause tõlge, kui voogedastuse kõne sisend? Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid, mis ootavad ja tõlkivad kindlaksmääratud aja jooksul, murravad sageli akustilisi üksusi kõnes, kuna akustiliste üksuste piirid kõnes ei ole ühtlased. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja MoSST, lihtne, kuid tõhus meetod voogedastuse sisu tõlkimiseks. Arvestades tavaliselt pikka kõnejärjestust, töötame kodeerija-dekooderi mudelis välja efektiivse monotoonilise segmenteerimismooduli, et akustilist informatsiooni järk-järgult koguda ja tuvastada kõneüksuse õiged piirid kõnetõlke sisendiks. Katsed MuST-C andmekogumi mitme tõlkesuunaga näitavad, et \\meetod ületab olemasolevaid meetodeid ja saavutab parima kompromisse tõlkekvaliteedi (BLEU) ja latentsuse vahel. Meie kood on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'fi': 'Miten löytää oikeat hetket tuottaa osittainen lausekäännös suoratoiston puhesyötteen avulla? Nykyiset lähestymistavat, jotka odottavat ja kääntävät tietyn ajan, rikkovat usein puheen akustisia yksiköitä, koska puheen akustisten yksiköiden rajat eivät ole tasaisia. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme MoSST:tä, yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta menetelmää suoratoiston puhesisällön kääntämiseen. Koska puhejakso on yleensä pitkä, kehitämme kooderi-dekooderimallin sisällä tehokkaan monotonisen segmentointimoduulin akustisen tiedon keräämiseksi asteittain ja oikeiden puheyksikön rajojen havaitsemiseksi puheen kääntämiseen. Kokeet MuST-C-aineiston useasta käännössuunnasta osoittavat, että \\metodi ylittää olemassa olevat menetelmät ja saavuttaa parhaan kompromissin käännöslaadun (BLEU) ja latenssin välillä. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'sw': 'Vipi kutafuta nyakati sahihi za kutengeneza tafsiri ya kifungu cha hukumu iliyotolewa na hotuba yenye nguvu? Ndani ya kuwepo inakaribia kusubiri na kutafsiri kwa muda mrefu mara nyingi huvunja viungo vya watu wa mashambulizi kwa hotuba, kwa sababu mipaka kati ya vitengo vya makundi vya watu wa kawaida si hata hivyo. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza MoSST, njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi wa kutafsiri maudhui ya hotuba. Kutokana na mfululizo mrefu wa hotuba kwa kawaida, tunaendelea kituo kinachotengeneza vifaa vya kuchaguliwa kwa ajili ya kazi ya kutafsiri kwa ajili ya kujieleza. Majaribio kuhusu maelekezo mbalimbali ya tafsiri ya taarifa za MuST-C yanaonyesha kwamba \\method hutoa mbinu zilizopo na kupata biashara bora kati ya kiwango cha kutafsiri (BLEU) na cha hivi karibuni. Utawala wetu unapatikana katika https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'ha': "Yãya gane a lokaci masu inganci da za'a ƙiƙiro fassarar birane na rabo da aka shigar da magana mai ƙaranci? Akwai na zo da sauri masu jira da tarjima zuwa wani mudan ajali da aka ƙudura, ko da yawa, za'a shawara tsakanin tsakanin ayukan da ke cikin magana, kuma ba su zama ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bukãtar da MoSST, wata hanyoyi mai sauƙi kuma mai amfani wa fassarar da maɓallin magana. Gida wani sauri mai tsawo na hotawa, za mu buɗe wata module da za'a yi amfani da shi a cikin wani misali na kode-kode don ka yi amfani da shi ga ɗabi'a kuma mu gane tsarin da ke daidaita wa aikin fassarar magana. Experiments on multi-translation direction of the Mustan-C dataset show that /Method outperforms existing metodes and achieves the best business-off between nau'in translation (BLEU) and latent. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.", 'sk': 'Kako najti ustrezne trenutke za ustvarjanje delnega prevoda stavka ob pretočnem govornem vnosu? Obstoječi pristopi, ki čakajo in prevajajo za določen čas, pogosto prekinejo akustične enote v govoru, saj meje med akustičnimi enotami v govoru niso enake. V tem prispevku predlagamo MoSST, enostavno, a učinkovito metodo prevajanja pretočnih govornih vsebin. Glede na običajno dolgo govorno zaporedje razvijamo učinkovit monotonični segmentacijski modul znotraj modela kodirnika-dekoderja, ki postopoma kopiči akustične informacije in zaznava ustrezne meje govorne enote za vnos v nalogo govornega prevajanja. Eksperimenti na več smereh prevajanja podatkovnega nabora MuST-C kažejo, da \\metoda presega obstoječe metode in dosega najboljši kompromis med kakovostjo prevajanja (BLEU) in latenco. Naša koda je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'jv': 'Text buddy Nang pemilih iki, kita mudhun MoSST, sira lak sempling maneh banget kanggo nggawe barang resmi. Genjer-genjer diunting langgar diolah sekondirne, kita nguasai eteffisisi model sing titimpen karo koder-decoder Name Awake kode sing dibutuhke ing https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'he': 'איך למצוא רגעים נכונים כדי ליצור תרגום משפטי חלקי שנתנה כניסה של דיבור זרם? גישות קיימות בהמתנה ותרגום במשך זמן קבוע לעתים קרובות שוברות את היחידות האקוסטיות בנאום, מאחר שהגבולות בין היחידות האקוסטיות בנאום אינם אפילו. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים MoSST, שיטה פשוטה אך יעילה לתרגום תוכן הנאום. בהתחשב ברצף נאום ארוך בדרך כלל, אנחנו מפתחים מודול מונטוני סגמנציה יעיל בתוך מודל קודד-קודד כדי לאסוף מידע אקוסטי באופן נוסף ולגלות גבולות יחידת נאום הנכונים עבור הכניסה בתפקיד התרגום נאום. ניסויים על כיווני תרגום מרובים של קבוצת נתונים MuST- C מראים ש \\שיטה יוצאת מעל שיטות קיימות ומגיעה את הסחר הטוב ביותר בין איכות תרגום (BLEU) לאטנציה. הקוד שלנו זמין ב https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དུས་ལ་ཆེན་ཤས་ཆུང་བའི་ཚིག་རྐང་ཞིག་ལ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་དགོས་སམ Existing approaches waiting-and-translating for a fixed duration often break the acoustic units in speech, since the boundaries between acoustic units in speech are not even. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་MoSST་ལ་སྔོན་འཇགས་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ཡིན་ན། Given a usually long speech sequence, we develop an efficient monotonic segmentation module inside an encoder-decoder model to accumulate acoustic information incrementally and detect proper speech unit boundaries for the input in speech translation task. Experiments on multiple translation directions of the MuST-C dataset show that \\method outperforms existing methods and achieves the best trade-off between translation quality (BLEU) and latency. ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/dqqcasia/mosst.'}
{'en': 'Training Data is More Valuable than You Think A Simple and Effective Method by Retrieving from Training Data', 'pt': 'Representações de token compacto com quantização contextual para reclassificação eficiente de documentos', 'es': 'Representaciones compactas de tokens con cuantificación contextual para una clasificación eficiente de documentos', 'fr': 'Représentations de jetons compactes avec quantification contextuelle pour un reclassement efficace des documents', 'ar': 'تمثيلات رمزية مضغوطة مع تكميم سياقي لإعادة تصنيف المستندات بكفاءة', 'ja': '効率的なドキュメントの再ランク付けのためのコンテキスト定量化を備えたコンパクトなトークン表現', 'hi': 'कुशल दस्तावेज़ पुन: रैंकिंग के लिए प्रासंगिक परिमाणीकरण के साथ कॉम्पैक्ट टोकन प्रतिनिधित्व', 'zh': '有上下文量化之紧凑型令牌,高效文档复序', 'ru': 'Компактные представления маркеров с контекстным квантованием для эффективного реранжирования документов', 'ga': 'Léiriúcháin Chomhartha Dlúth le Cainníochtú Comhthéacsúil le haghaidh Athrangú Éifeachtach Doiciméid', 'el': 'Συμπαγές αναπαραστάσεις σημαδιών με περιεκτική ποσοτικοποίηση για αποτελεσματική επανακατάταξη εγγράφων', 'hu': 'Kompakt tokenreprezentációk kontextusmennyiséggel a hatékony dokumentumok átrendezése érdekében', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Rappresentazioni compatte di token con quantizzazione contestuale per una riorganizzazione efficiente dei documenti', 'kk': 'Құжатты қайта реттеу үшін контексті кеңейтілген токен кеңейтулері', 'lt': 'Komplektinės žymenų reprezentacijos su kontekstiniu kiekybiniu skaičiavimu veiksmingam dokumentų perskirstymui', 'mk': 'Компактни претставувања на токените со контекстна квантизација за ефикасно рерангирање на документот', 'ml': 'രേഖയുടെ വീണ്ടും റാങ്ങിങ്ങിനുള്ള രേഖയ്ക്കു് വേണ്ടി ടോക്കന്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d കൊണ്ടു് സജ്ജീകരിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Token Compact dengan Quantization Konteksual untuk Pengarahan Semula Dokumen Efisien', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet kompatti tat-Token mal-Kwantifikazzjoni Kuntest għal Klassifikazzjoni mill-ġdid Effiċjenti tad-Dokument', 'mn': 'Compact Token Representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re ranking', 'no': 'Compact Token representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re ranking', 'pl': 'Kompaktowe reprezentacje tokenów z kontekstową kwantyzacją dla efektywnego ponownego rankingu dokumentów', 'ro': 'Reprezentări de jetoane compacte cu cuantificare contextuală pentru o reexaminare eficientă a documentelor', 'sr': 'Kompaktni predstavnici Tokena sa kontekstualnom kvantizacijom za ponovno redoviranje učinkovitog dokumenta', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Kompakt tokenrepresentation med kontextuell kvantisering för effektiv omräkning av dokument', 'so': 'Compact Token Representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re-ranking', 'ta': 'Compact Token Representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re-ranking', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Lý do ví dụ', 'nl': 'Compacte tokenrepresentaties met contextuele kwantificatie voor efficiënte documentheroriëntatie', 'hr': 'Kompaktni predstavnici Tokena s kontekstualnom kvantizacijom za učinkovito ponovno redoviranje dokumenta', 'de': 'Kompakte Token-Repräsentationen mit kontextueller Quantisierung für effizientes Dokumentumranking', 'bg': 'Компактни изображения на токени с контекстно количествено определяне за ефективно повторно класиране на документите', 'da': 'Kompakt tokenrepræsentationer med kontekstuel kvantisering for effektiv dokumentomregning', 'sw': 'Compact Token Representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re-ranking', 'id': 'Compact Token Representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re-ranking', 'tr': 'Yetersi Sened bejermek üçin Token Wasplaýyşlary bilen', 'ko': '촘촘한 영패 표시와 상하문 양적화로 문서를 효과적으로 재배열할 수 있다', 'fa': 'نمایش\u200cدهندگان Token با مقدار\u200cبندی محیط برای دوباره رشته\u200cبندی سند تاثیر', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përfaqësues kompakte të Token me Quantization Konteksual për Rirenditjen Efikase të Dokumentit', 'am': 'Compact Token Representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re-ranking', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Kompaktni predstavnici Tokena sa kontekstualnom kvantizacijom za ponovno redoviranje učinkovitog dokumenta', 'ca': 'Representacions Compactes de Token amb Quantització Contextual per a una re-classificació eficient de documentos', 'cs': 'Kompaktní reprezentace tokenů s kontextovou kvantizací pro efektivní přehodnocení dokumentů', 'az': 'Etkinlik D칬k칲m톛nin Yenid톛n Seyirl톛ndirm톛si 칲칞칲n Contextual Quantization il톛 T톛kin Temsill톛ri', 'bn': 'Name', 'et': 'Kompaktsed märkide esitused kontekstikvantiseerimisega tõhusaks dokumendi ümberhindamiseks', 'fi': 'Kompaktit polettiesitykset kontekstuaalisella kvantisoinnilla tehokkaaseen asiakirjojen uudelleensijoitukseen', 'he': 'מייצגות טוקנים משותפות עם מייצג קונטקסטי עבור שידור מסמכים יעיל', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Kompaktne predstavitve žetonov z kontekstno kvantizacijo za učinkovito ponovno razvrstitev dokumentov', 'jv': 'Compct Token representations with contextual Cuentation for Efeffent document Re-ranging', 'bo': 'Compact Token Representations with Contextual Quantization for Efficient Document Re-ranking'}
{'en': 'Retrieval based methods have been shown to be effective in NLP tasks via introducing external knowledge However the indexing and retrieving of large scale corpora bring considerable computational cost Surprisingly we found that REtrieving from the traINing datA REINA only can lead to significant gains on multiple NLG and NLU tasks We retrieve the labeled training instances most similar to the input text and then concatenate them with the input to feed into the model to generate the output Experimental results show that this simple method can achieve significantly better performance on a variety of NLU and NLG tasks including summarization machine translation language modeling and question answering tasks For instance our proposed method achieved state of the art results on XSum BigPatent and CommonsenseQA Our code is released https://github.com/microsoft/REINA', 'ar': 'يمكن أن تحقق نماذج إعادة الترتيب القائمة على المحولات صلة بحث عالية من خلال المطابقة الناعمة المدركة للسياق لرموز الاستعلام المميزة مع الرموز المميزة للمستند. للتخفيف من تعقيد وقت التشغيل لمثل هذا الاستدلال ، اعتمد العمل السابق بنية تفاعلية متأخرة مع تمثيلات رمزية سياقية محسوبة مسبقًا على حساب مساحة تخزين كبيرة عبر الإنترنت. تقترح هذه الورقة تكميمًا سياقيًا لحفلات الزفاف الرمزية عن طريق فصل مساهمات الترتيب الخاصة بالوثيقة والمستقلة عن المستند أثناء الضغط المستند إلى دفتر الرموز. هذا يسمح بإزالة الضغط بشكل فعال عبر الإنترنت وتضمين التكوين لتحسين ملاءمة البحث. تقدم هذه الورقة تقييمًا لنموذج تمثيل الرمز المضغوط أعلاه من حيث الملاءمة وكفاءة المساحة.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de reclassificação baseados em transformadores podem alcançar alta relevância de pesquisa por meio de correspondência suave sensível ao contexto de tokens de consulta com tokens de documento. Para aliviar a complexidade do tempo de execução de tal inferência, trabalhos anteriores adotaram uma arquitetura de interação tardia com representações de token contextuais pré-computadas ao custo de um grande armazenamento online. Este artigo propõe a quantização contextual de embeddings de token ao desacoplar contribuições de classificação específicas de documentos e independentes de documentos durante a compactação baseada em livro de códigos. Isso permite descompressão online eficaz e composição de incorporação para melhor relevância de pesquisa. Este artigo apresenta uma avaliação do modelo de representação de token compacto acima em termos de relevância e eficiência de espaço.', 'fr': "Les modèles de reclassement basés sur les transformateurs peuvent atteindre une pertinence de recherche élevée grâce à une correspondance souple sensible au contexte des jetons de requête avec des jetons de document. Pour réduire la complexité d'exécution d'une telle inférence, des travaux antérieurs ont adopté une architecture d'interaction tardive avec des représentations de jetons contextuelles précalculées au prix d'un stockage en ligne important. Cet article propose une quantification contextuelle des intégrations de jetons en découplant les contributions de classement spécifiques au document et indépendantes du document pendant la compression basée sur le livre de codes. Cela permet une décompression en ligne et une composition d'intégration efficaces pour une meilleure pertinence des recherches. Cet article présente une évaluation du modèle de représentation de jetons compact ci-dessus en termes de pertinence et d'efficacité spatiale.", 'es': 'Los modelos de reordenamiento basados en transformadores pueden lograr una alta relevancia de búsqueda a través de la coincidencia suave consciente del contexto de los tokens de consulta con los tokens Para aliviar la complejidad del tiempo de ejecución de dicha inferencia, trabajos anteriores han adoptado una arquitectura de interacción tardía con representaciones de tokens contextuales precalculadas a costa de un gran almacenamiento en línea. Este artículo propone la cuantificación contextual de incrustaciones de tokens mediante el desacoplamiento de las contribuciones de clasificación específicas del documento y las independientes del documento durante la compresión basada en libros de códigos. Esto permite una descompresión en línea eficaz y una composición de incrustación para una mejor relevancia de búsqueda. Este artículo presenta una evaluación del modelo de representación de fichas compacto anterior en términos de relevancia y eficiencia espacial.', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर आधारित पुन: रैंकिंग मॉडल संदर्भ के माध्यम से उच्च खोज प्रासंगिकता प्राप्त कर सकते हैं- दस्तावेज़ टोकन के साथ क्वेरी टोकन के बारे में पता नरम मिलान। इस तरह के अनुमान की रनटाइम जटिलता को कम करने के लिए, पिछले काम ने एक बड़े ऑनलाइन भंडारण की कीमत पर पूर्व-गणना किए गए प्रासंगिक टोकन प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ देर से बातचीत वास्तुकला को अपनाया है। यह पेपर कोडबुक-आधारित संपीड़न के दौरान दस्तावेज़-विशिष्ट और दस्तावेज़-स्वतंत्र रैंकिंग योगदान को डिकपलिंग करके टोकन एम्बेडिंग के प्रासंगिक परिमाणीकरण का प्रस्ताव करता है। यह बेहतर खोज प्रासंगिकता के लिए प्रभावी ऑनलाइन डिकंप्रेशन और एम्बेडिंग संरचना की अनुमति देता है। यह पेपर प्रासंगिकता और अंतरिक्ष दक्षता के संदर्भ में उपरोक्त कॉम्पैक्ट टोकन प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल का मूल्यांकन प्रस्तुत करता है।', 'zh': '盖转换器之复名上下文可以上下文知者问令牌与文档令牌之软匹以成高索相关性。 以轻其行复杂性,前事用一后交架构,当架构预计之上下文令牌,而代用大在线。 本文建于代码簿之压缩,以特定于文档排名贡献与独立于文档者耦来对令牌嵌上下文量化。 此许效者在线解压缩嵌组合,以得善相关性。 本文以相关性空效率之角代币为质。', 'ja': 'トランスフォーマーベースの再ランクモデルは、クエリトークンとドキュメントトークンのコンテキスト認識型ソフトマッチングを通じて、高い検索関連性を達成することができます。そのような推論の実行時の複雑さを軽減するために、以前の作業は、大規模なオンラインストレージの代わりに、事前に計算されたコンテキストトークン表現を備えた後期インタラクションアーキテクチャを採用しています。この論文では、コードブックベースの圧縮中にドキュメント固有およびドキュメントに依存しないランキングの貢献を分離することによって、トークン埋め込みのコンテキスト量子化を提案しています。これにより、検索の関連性を向上させるために、効果的なオンライン減圧および埋め込み組成物が可能になります。関連性と空間効率の観点から、上記のコンパクトトークン表現モデルの評価を提示した。', 'ru': 'Модели повторного ранжирования на основе трансформаторов могут достичь высокой релевантности поиска за счет контекстно-зависимого мягкого сопоставления маркеров запросов с маркерами документов. Чтобы облегчить сложность выполнения такого вывода, в предыдущей работе была принята поздняя архитектура взаимодействия с предварительно вычисленными контекстными представлениями токенов за счет большого онлайн-хранилища. В этой статье предлагается контекстное квантование вложений токенов путем разделения вкладов в ранжирование, специфичное для документа и не зависящее от документа, во время сжатия на основе кодовой книги. Это обеспечивает эффективную онлайн-декомпрессию и встраивание композиции для лучшей релевантности поиска. В настоящем документе представлена оценка вышеуказанной компактной модели представления токенов с точки зрения актуальности и эффективности использования пространства.', 'ga': 'Is féidir le samhlacha athrangaithe atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán ard-ábharthacht cuardaigh a bhaint amach trí chomharthaí fiosrúcháin a mheaitseáil go bog ar an eolas faoi chomhthéacs agus comharthaí doiciméad. Chun castacht an ama rite a bhaineann leis an tátal sin a mhaolú, ghlac obair a rinneadh roimhe seo le hailtireacht idirghníomhaíochta dhéanach le huiríll réamhríofa comhthéacsúla ar chostas stórála mór ar líne. Molann an páipéar seo cainníochtú comhthéacsúil ar leabaithe chomharthaí trí ranníocaíochtaí rangaithe doiciméad-shonracha agus doiciméad-neamhspleách a dhíchúpláil le linn comhbhrú bunaithe ar chódleabhair. Ligeann sé seo dí-chomhbhrú éifeachtach ar líne agus comhdhéanamh a leabú ar mhaithe le hábharthacht cuardaigh níos fearr. Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair meastóireacht ar an tsamhail ionadaíochta dearbháin dhlúth thuas i dtéarmaí ábharthacht agus éifeachtúlacht spáis.', 'hu': 'A transzformátor alapú újraértékelési modellek nagy keresési relevanciát érhetnek el a lekérdezési tokenek kontextustudatos és dokumentumtokenekkel történő egyeztetésével. Az ilyen következtetés futásidő bonyolultságának enyhítése érdekében a korábbi munkák egy késői interakciós architektúrát alkalmaztak, amely előre kiszámított kontextuális tokenreprezentációkat tartalmaz egy nagy online tárhely árán. Jelen tanulmány a tokenbeágyazások kontextuális kvantizálását javasolja a dokumentumspecifikus és dokumentumfüggetlen rangsorolási hozzájárulások leválasztásával a kódkönyv alapú tömörítés során. Ez lehetővé teszi a hatékony online dekompresszió és beágyazási összetétel a jobb keresési relevancia érdekében. Jelen tanulmány a fenti kompakt tokenreprezentációs modell relevanciája és helyhatékonysága szempontjából történő értékelését mutatja be.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα επανακατάταξης με βάση τον μετασχηματιστή μπορούν να επιτύχουν υψηλή συνάφεια αναζήτησης μέσω της μαλακής αντιστοίχισης των σημάτων ερωτήματος με τα σήματα εγγράφων. Για να ανακουφιστεί η πολυπλοκότητα τέτοιων συμπερασμάτων σε χρόνο εκτέλεσης, η προηγούμενη εργασία υιοθέτησε μια αρχιτεκτονική αργής αλληλεπίδρασης με προεκτιμημένες αναπαραστάσεις συμβολαίων συμφραζόμενων με κόστος ενός μεγάλου διαδικτυακού χώρου αποθήκευσης. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει την κβαντισμό των συμβολαίων ενσωμάτωσης μέσω της αποσύνδεσης των συνεισφορών κατάταξης συγκεκριμένων εγγράφων και ανεξάρτητων από έγγραφα κατά τη διάρκεια συμπίεσης βασισμένης στο βιβλίο κωδικών. Αυτό επιτρέπει αποτελεσματική αποσυμπίεση και ενσωμάτωση σύνθεσης για καλύτερη συνάφεια αναζήτησης. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια αξιολόγηση του παραπάνω μοντέλου αναπαράστασης συμπαγούς σήματος όσον αφορά τη συνάφεια και την αποδοτικότητα του χώρου.', 'it': "I modelli di ri-ranking basati su trasformatori possono ottenere un'elevata rilevanza per la ricerca attraverso la corrispondenza morbida contestuale dei token di query con i token di documento. Per alleviare la complessità del runtime di tale inferenza, il lavoro precedente ha adottato un'architettura di interazione tardiva con rappresentazioni di token contestuali pre-calcolate al costo di un ampio storage online. Questo articolo propone una quantizzazione contestuale delle incorporazioni di token disaccoppiando i contributi di classificazione specifici per documenti e indipendenti dai documenti durante la compressione basata su codebook. Ciò consente un'efficace decompressione online e composizione di incorporazione per una migliore rilevanza della ricerca. Questo articolo presenta una valutazione del modello di rappresentazione dei token compatti sopra descritto in termini di rilevanza ed efficienza dello spazio.", 'kk': 'Трансформация негіздеген қайта реттеу үлгілері құжат белгілерімен сұраныс белгілеріне сәйкес келетін сұраныс белгілері арқылы жоғары іздеу үлгісін жеткізе алады. Бұл инференцияның орындау уақытын көшірмелеу үшін, алдыңғы жұмыс онлайн сақтау үлкен онлайн сақтау бағасы бойынша, алдыңғы жұмыс алдыңғы есептелген контексті белгілер архитектурасына Бұл қағаз кодтабу негіздеген компрессиясы кезінде құжаттың ерекше және құжаттың тәуелсіз жолдарының көмегімен белгілер ендірудің контексті квантизациялауын ұсынады. Бұл онлайн декомпрессия және жақсы іздеу үшін құрылғысын ендіруге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл қағаз жоғардағы компакт белгілерді көрсету үлгісінің маңыздылығы мен бос орын эффективілігін қарап көрсетеді.', 'ka': 'Name ამ ინფრენციის კომპლექსიტურობის გახსნა, წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო ინტერექტიკური აქტიქტიქტიკური დააყენება, რომელიც წინ დამუშაობით კონტექსტური სამუშაო სა ამ დოკუმენტის კონტექსტური კვანტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტურაცია, რომელიც დოკუმენტის განსაკუთრებული და დოკუმენტის განსაკუთრებული კონქსტურაცი Name ეს წიგნის შესახებ მოდელის გამოსახულებელობა და მსოფლიო ეფექციურობის შესახებ მოდელის შესახებ გამოსახულება.', 'lt': 'Transformatoriais pagrįsti perklasifikavimo modeliai gali pasiekti didelę paieškos svarbą, atsižvelgiant į kontekstą, nesuderinant užklausos ženklų su dokumentų ženklais. Siekiant palengvinti tokios išvados sudėtingumą eksploatavimo metu, ankstesniame darbe buvo priimta vėluojama sąveikos architektūra su iš anksto apskaičiuotais kontekstiniais ženklais už didelį internetinį saugojimą. Šiame dokumente siūloma kiekybiškai įvertinti žymenų įdėjimus atskiriant konkrečiam dokumentui skirtus ir nepriklausomus įnašus į klasifikaciją kodų knygos spaudimo metu. Tai leidžia veiksmingai dekompresuoti internetą ir įtraukti sudėtį siekiant geresnio paieškos svarbos. This paper presents an evaluation of the above compact token representation model in terms of relevance and space efficiency.', 'mk': 'Моделите за рерангирање базирани на трансформирање можат да постигнат висока релевантност на пребарувањето преку меко споредување на знаци за пребарување со знаци за документи, свесно за контекст. За да се олесни комплексноста на текот на ваквата конференција, претходната работа усвои доцна архитектура за интеракција со преобчистени контекстуални претставувања на знаци за цена на големо онлајн складиште. Овој документ предложува контекстуална квантизација на вградувањата на знаци преку декопирање на придонесите за рангирање специфични за документите и независни од документите за време на компресијата базирана на кодот. Ова овозможува ефикасна онлајн декомпресија и вградување на композиција за подобра релевантност на пребарувањето. Овој документ претставува проценка на наведениот компактен модел на претставување на знаци во поглед на релевантноста и вселенската ефикасност.', 'ms': 'Model pengukuran semula berdasarkan pengubah boleh mencapai relevansi gelintar tinggi melalui persamaan lembut yang sedar-konteks token pertanyaan dengan token dokumen. Untuk mengurangi kompleksiti masa berjalan dari kesimpulan tersebut, kerja terdahulu telah mengadopsi arkitektur interaksi lewat dengan perwakilan token kontekstual pra-komputer dengan biaya penyimpanan dalam talian yang besar. Kertas ini mencadangkan kuantisasi kontekstual bagi penyampilan token dengan menyambungkan kontribusi peringkat tertentu-dokumen dan bebas-dokumen semasa pemampatan berdasarkan kodebook. Name Kertas ini memperkenalkan penilaian model perwakilan token kompak di atas dalam terma relevansi dan efisiensi ruang.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni mill-ġdid ibbażati fuq it-trasformaturi jistgħu jiksbu rilevanza għolja għat-tfittxija permezz ta’ tqabbil dgħajjef konxju mill-kuntest tat-tokens tal-mistoqsijiet ma’ tokens tad-dokumenti. To alleviate runtime complexity of such inference, previous work has adopted a late interaction architecture with pre-computed contextual token representations at the cost of a large online storage.  Dan id-dokument jipproponi kwantifikazzjoni kuntestwali tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-tokens permezz tad-diżakkoppjar tal-kontribuzzjonijiet tal-klassifikazzjoni speċifiċi għad-dokument u indipendenti mid-dokument matul il-kompressjoni bbażata fuq il-kodiċi. Dan jippermetti dekompressjoni effettiva onlajn u kompożizzjoni inkorporata għal rilevanza aħjar għat-tiftix. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta evalwazzjoni tal-mudell ta’ rappreżentazzjoni kompatta tat-tokens ta’ hawn fuq f’termini ta’ rilevanza u effiċjenza spazjali.', 'ml': '@ info: status ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള അപകടത്തിന്റെ റൌണ്\u200dടൈറ്റ് സമയത്തിന്റെ സംബന്ധം ലഘൂകരിക്കാന്\u200d, മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി ഒരു വൈകാതെ ഇടപെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. എണ്ണിയി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കോഡ്ബുക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ചുരുക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d രേഖ-പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും രേഖ-സ്വാതന്ത്രതയുള്ള റാങ്ങിങ് ചെലവഴിക്കുന്നതിന ഇത് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഡിക്കോമ്പ്രഷനും കൂടുതല്\u200d തെരച്ചിലുള്ള സംവിധാനത്തിനായി സജ്ജമാക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d മുകളിലുള്ള ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Трансформацийн суурилсан дахин хэлбэрийн загварууд баримт тэмдэглэгддэг квадрат тэмдэгтийг мэдэхээр өндөр хайлтын чухал байдлыг олох боломжтой. Эдгээр халдварын цогцыг багасгахын тулд, өмнөх ажил маш том онлайн хадгалалтын үнэ цэнэтэй харилцааны архитектур ашиглаж байна. Энэ цаас кодекс номын үндсэн цуглуулалтын үед баримт тодорхой болон баримт-тогтнолтой цуглуулалтын үр дүнг хурааж байгуулахын тулд орчин үеийн тооны хэмжээсүүдийг санал болгодог. Энэ нь илүү сайн хайлтын тулд эффективнуудыг онлайн хэсгүүдийн халдварлах боломжтой болгодог. Энэ цаас дээрх компакт тэмдэгтийн илэрхийлэл загварын үнэлгээг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Modele zmiany rankingu oparte na transformatorach mogą osiągnąć wysoką trafność wyszukiwania poprzez kontekstowe miękkie dopasowanie tokenów zapytań z tokenami dokumentów. Aby zmniejszyć złożoność tego typu wniosków w czasie wykonywania, poprzednie prace przyjęły architekturę późnej interakcji z wstępnie obliczonymi kontekstowymi reprezentacjami tokenów kosztem dużej pamięci masowej online. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje kontekstową kwantyzację osadzeń tokenów poprzez oddzielenie wkładów rankingowych dla dokumentów i dokumentów niezależnych od dokumentów podczas kompresji opartej na kodeksie. Pozwala to na skuteczną dekompresję online i osadzanie kompozycji dla lepszego znaczenia wyszukiwania. W artykule przedstawiono ocenę powyższego kompaktowego modelu reprezentacji tokenów pod względem znaczenia i efektywności przestrzeni.', 'ro': 'Modelele de re-ranking bazate pe transformatori pot obține o relevanță ridicată a căutării prin potrivirea soft conștientă de context a jetoanelor de interogare cu jetoanele de document. Pentru a atenua complexitatea runtime a unei astfel de inferențe, lucrările anterioare au adoptat o arhitectură de interacțiune târzie cu reprezentări contextuale pre-calculate de token la costul unui spațiu de stocare online mare. Această lucrare propune cuantificarea contextuală a încorporărilor token prin decuplarea contribuțiilor de clasificare specifice documentelor și independente de document în timpul compresiei bazate pe cartea de coduri. Acest lucru permite decompresie online eficientă și compoziție de încorporare pentru o mai bună relevanță a căutării. Această lucrare prezintă o evaluare a modelului compact de reprezentare a token-urilor de mai sus în ceea ce privește relevanța și eficiența spațiului.', 'no': 'Name Førre arbeid har godtatt ein sein interaksjonsstruktur med førerekna kontekstiske representasjonar på bruk av eit stor nettlagring for å redusere køyrande kompleksitet av slike infeksjon. Denne papiret foreslår kontekst kvantisering av innbygging av token ved å dekomprimera dokumentspesifiserte og dokumentuavhengige rekningsbehandlingar under kodebokserte komprimering. Dette tillèt effektiv nettdekompresjon og innbygging av komponent for betre søkjevendighet. Denne papiret viser eit evaluering av den øvste kompakte tegnstillingsmodellen i uttrykket av relevant og mellomromeffektivitet.', 'sr': 'Preobraćajući modeli ponovno reagiranja mogu postići važnost pretraživanja kroz kontekstski svestan meko odgovarajući znakovima pitanja sa znakovima dokumenta. Da bi se ublažila kompleksnost pokretanja takve infekcije, prethodni rad je usvojio kasnu arhitekturu interakcije sa predračunalnim kontekstualnim predstavljanjem znakova za cenu velikog online skladišta. Ovaj papir predlaže kontekstualnu kvantizaciju ugrađenja znakova, rasključujući specifične dokumente i nezavisni doprinos za ranking tokom kompresije na kodebovu. To omogućava efektivnu online dekompresiju i integraciju kompozicije za bolju relevantnost pretraživanja. Ovaj papir predstavlja procjenu modela predstavljanja iznad kompaktnih znakova u smislu relevantnosti i svemirske efikasnosti.', 'si': 'Name මේ විනාශයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ කරන්න, මුලින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විනාශයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදි Name Name මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ උපරිම සම්පූර්ණ ටොක්න් පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අකාශ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයක් වග', 'so': 'Tusaaladaha lagu soo wareejiyay ee lagu soo wareejiyo waxay ku heli karaan faa’iido dheer oo ku habboon qoraalka-aqoonta qoriga ah ee la xiriira calaamadaha qoraalka. Si uu u fududeeyo dhibaatada waqtiga hore oo caynkaas ah, shaqadii hore wuxuu qaatay dhismaha dib u dhexaysa oo uu horay u tiriyey calaamado hore oo ku saabsan kharashka ku baxa badbaadada internetka. Warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa qiyaastii joogtada ah oo calaamada lagu soo bandhigi karo marka lagu qorayo koobsashada qoraalka ee gaarka ah iyo qoraalka madax banaan. Taas waxay faa’iido u yeelan karaan habka internetka iyo qeyb ka sameynta si aad u hesho faa’iidada raadinta. Qoraalkan waxaa lagu qoraa qiimeynta sameynta calaamada ka sareeya ee ku saabsan xiriirka iyo faa’iidada cirka.', 'sv': 'Transformerbaserade omräkningsmodeller kan uppnå hög sökrelevans genom kontextmedveten mjuk matchning av frågetokens med dokumenttokens. För att lindra körtidskomplexiteten av sådana slutsatser har tidigare arbete antagit en sen interaktionsarkitektur med förberäknade kontextuella token representationer på bekostnad av en stor onlinelagring. Denna uppsats föreslår kontextuell kvantisering av token inbäddningar genom att frikoppla dokumentspecifika och dokumentoberoende rankningsbidrag under kodboksbaserad komprimering. Detta möjliggör effektiv online dekompression och inbäddning komposition för bättre sökrelevans. Denna uppsats presenterar en utvärdering av ovanstående kompakta tokenrepresentationsmodell med avseende på relevans och utrymmeseffektivitet.', 'ur': 'Name اس طرح کی پیچیدگی کی کمزوری کے لئے پہلے سے کام نے ایک اچھی پیچیدگی معماری بنائی ہے جو ایک بڑی آنلاین انٹوریج کے مطابق پیش محاسبہ کی کنٹکسٹیول ٹوکنوں کی نشانیوں کے ساتھ ہے۔ This paper proposes contextual quantization of token embedding by decoupling document-specific and document-independent ranking contributions during codebook-based compression. یہ اچھی تلاش کی اثرات کے لئے اثرات آنلاین کی دھوپ اور پیدا کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. یہ کاغذ ایک مقررہ ٹوکنوں کے نمونہ کا ارزش دکھاتا ہے جو اہم اور فضا کے مطابق ہے۔', 'ta': 'மாற்றப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் ஆவண குறியீடுகளுடன் கேள்வி குறியீடுகளுடன் தெரியும் மென் பொருத்தம் மூலம் உயர் தேடும் முறைமை இத்தகைய பாதிப்பின் இயக்க நேரத்தின் சிக்கல்களை எளிதாக்க, முந்தைய வேலை ஒரு தாமதமான இடைவெளிச்செயல் உருவாக்கத்தை எடுத்துக் கொண்டு முன் கணக்க இந்த தாள் குறியீடு சுருக்கும் போது ஆவண- குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் ஆவண- சுதந்திரமான நிரல் செலவுகளை வெளியேற்றும் போது குறியீட்டு  இது சிறந்த தேடும் தொடர்புக்கான இயல்பான மற்றும் சிறந்த தேடும் சொருகுப்பொருளை செயல்படுத்தும் ஆன்லைன இந்த காகிதத்தின் தொடர்பு மற்றும் இடைவெளி விளைவுக்குறிப்பின் மாதிரியின் மதிப்பினை மேலே உள்ள குறிப்பிடும', 'uz': "Comment Bunday ishlayotgan vaqt murakkablarini kamaytirish uchun oldingi vazifa bir necha interaction arkitektikasiga ishlatiladi. Bu katta onlin saqlash qiymatida bir necha xil belgi representations. Бу саҳифа ҳужжат махсус ва ҳужжат мувофиқ кўчирилган фойдаланишни кодлаш асосида фойдаланишини кўрсатади. Name Ushbu qogʻoz esa eng yuqori kompakt belgilangan modelni qiymatlashni koʻrsatiladi. Ushbu qogʻoz bogʻ'liq va фазy effekti bilan ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Thay đổi nền tạo biến hình có thể đạt mức độ tìm kiếm cao nhờ ăn dạng mềm tương ứng với các thẻ truy vấn bằng các thẻ tài liệu. Để làm giảm sự phức tạp thời gian chạy bộ của luận số này, công việc trước đây đã chọn một kiến trúc giao tiếp trễ với các biểu tượng chụp hình nền được tính toán với giá trị của một kho lưu trữ trên mạng lớn. Tờ giấy này đề nghị tổng số lượng nội dung của sự ràng buộc bằng việc tách rời các tài liệu đặc biệt và độc lập tài liệu trong suốt việc ép buộc. Việc này cho phép kết hợp áp lực trực tuyến hiệu quả và tác dụng để tìm kiếm. Tờ giấy này đưa ra đánh giá về mô hình tượng tượng tượng trưng thu gọn này về mức độ liên quan và hiệu quả không gian.', 'da': 'Transformerbaserede re-rankingmodeller kan opnå høj søgeresultat gennem kontekstbevidst blød matching af forespørgselsetkens med dokumenttokens. For at afhjælpe kompleksiteten ved kørselstid af en sådan konklusion har tidligere arbejde vedtaget en sen interaktionsarkitektur med forudberegnede kontekstuelle token repræsentationer på bekostning af et stort online lager. Denne artikel foreslår kontekstuel kvantisering af token-indlejringer ved at afkoble dokumentspecifikke og dokumentuafhængige rankingbidrag under kodebog-baseret komprimering. Dette muliggør effektiv online dekompression og indlejring sammensætning for bedre søgeresultat. Denne artikel præsenterer en evaluering af ovennævnte kompakte token repræsentation model med hensyn til relevans og pladseffektivitet.', 'de': 'Transformer-basierte Re-Ranking-Modelle können eine hohe Suchrelevanz durch kontextbewusstes Soft Matching von Abfrage-Token mit Dokument-Token erreichen. Um die Laufzeitkomplexität solcher Inferenzen zu verringern, wurde in früheren Arbeiten eine späte Interaktionsarchitektur mit vorberechneten kontextuellen Token-Darstellungen auf Kosten eines großen Online-Speichers eingeführt. Diese Arbeit schlägt eine kontextuelle Quantisierung von Token-Einbettungen vor, indem dokumentspezifische und dokumentunabhängige Rankingbeiträge während der codebook-basierten Komprimierung entkoppelt werden. Dies ermöglicht eine effektive Online-Dekompression und Einbettung der Komposition für eine bessere Suchrelevanz. In diesem Beitrag wird eine Bewertung des obigen kompakten Token-Repräsentationsmodells hinsichtlich Relevanz und Raumeffizienz vorgestellt.', 'bg': 'Моделите за повторно класиране на базата на трансформатори могат да постигнат висока релевантност при търсенето чрез софтуерно съвпадение на символите за заявки с документални символи. За да се облекчи сложността на такова заключение във времето на изпълнение, предишната работа е приела архитектура за късно взаимодействие с предварително изчислени контекстуални символни представяния на цената на голямо онлайн съхранение. Настоящата статия предлага контекстуално квантизиране на вгражданията на символи чрез отделяне на специфичните документи и независимите документи приноси за класиране по време на компресиране на базата на кодова книга. Това позволява ефективна онлайн декомпресия и вграждане на композиция за по-добра релевантност на търсенето. Настоящата статия представя оценка на горепосочения модел на компактно представяне на символи по отношение на релевантността и ефективността на пространството.', 'nl': 'Transformer gebaseerde re-ranking modellen kunnen een hoge zoekrelevantie bereiken door contextbewuste soft matching van query tokens met document tokens. Om de runtime complexiteit van dergelijke inferentie te verlichten, heeft vorig werk een late interactie architectuur met vooraf berekende contextuele token representaties aangenomen ten koste van een grote online opslag. Deze paper stelt contextuele kwantisatie van token embeddings voor door document-specifieke en document-onafhankelijke ranking bijdragen te ontkoppelen tijdens codebook gebaseerde compressie. Dit maakt effectieve online decompressie en insluiten van compositie mogelijk voor een betere zoekrelevantie. Dit artikel presenteert een evaluatie van het bovenstaande compacte tokenrepresentatiemodel in termen van relevantie en ruimteefficiëntie.', 'hr': 'Preobraćajući modeli ponovno reagiranja mogu postići važnost pretraživanja kroz kontekstski svestan meko odgovarajući znakovima ispitivanja s znakovima dokumenta. Za ublažavanje složenosti takve infekcije, prethodni rad je usvojio kasnu arhitekturu interakcije s predračunalnim kontekstualnim znakovima na cijenu velikog online skladišta. Ovaj papir predlaže kontekstualnu kvantizaciju ugrađenja znakova odključanjem doprinosa za specifične dokumente i nezavisnih redova na dokumentu tijekom kompresije bazirane na kodeksu. To omogućava učinkovitu online dekompresiju i ugrađivanje kompozicije za bolju relevantnost pretraživanja. Ovaj papir predstavlja procjenu modela predstavljanja iznad kompaktnih znakova u smislu relevantnosti i učinkovitosti svemira.', 'fa': 'مدلهای دوباره رقابت پایه تغییر دهنده می\u200cتوانند با توجه به جستجوی بالا از طریق متصل- آگاهی نرم از نشانه\u200cهای سوال با نشانه\u200cهای سند را به دست آورد. برای کمبود پیچیدگی زمان اجرای چنین آلودگی، کار قبلی یک معماری تفاوت دیر را با نمایش نشانه\u200cهای موضوع پیش از محاسبه به قیمت یک انبار بزرگ آنلاین پذیرفته است. این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که مقدار\u200cسازی موقعیتی از پیوند\u200cسازی\u200cهای نشانه\u200cها با دستگاه\u200cسازی رشته\u200cهای مخصوص سند و سند-مستقل در طول پیوند\u200cسازی بر اساس کاغذ\u200cکتاب\u200cهای کودک\u200cکتاب این اجازه می\u200cدهد که تزریق\u200cکننده\u200cهای آنلاین موثر و تزریق\u200cسازی برای مربوط به جستجوی بهتر باشد. این کاغذ یک ارزیابی از مدل نمایش نمایش نشانه\u200cهای قطعی بالا را به عنوان ارزش و موثیت فضا نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa kutafuta tena wa zamani unaweza kupata umuhimu mkubwa wa kutafuta kupitia muktadha- ukilinganishwa na hali ngumu ya utafiti kwa ishara za nyaraka. Ili kupunguza tatizo la muda mfupi wa ugonjwa huu, kazi iliyopita imechukua ujenzi wa mwisho wa mazingira na wawakilishi wa alama za awali zilizokadiriwa kabla ya kuhesabiwa kwa gharama kubwa ya kuhifadhia mtandaoni. Makala hii inapendekeza kiasi kikubwa cha kuweka ishara kwa kuondoa michango ya nyaraka maalum na yenye dokumentari huru wakati wa kompyuta iliyoandaliwa na makala. Hii inaruhusu kukandamizwa kwa ufanisi wa mtandaoni na kuweka ujumbe wa kutafuta umuhimu mzuri zaidi. Gazeti hili linaonyesha tathmini ya muundo wa uwakilishaji ishara ya juu kwa namna ya umuhimu na ufanisi wa space.', 'id': 'Model pengukuran ulang berdasarkan Transformer dapat mencapai relevansi pencarian tinggi melalui konteks-sadar sepadan lembut token pertanyaan dengan token dokumen. Untuk mengurangi kompleksitas waktu berjalan dari kesimpulan seperti itu, pekerjaan sebelumnya telah mengadopsi arsitektur interaksi terlambat dengan persembahan token kontekstual pre-komputer dengan biaya penyimpanan online besar. Kertas ini mengusulkan kuantisasi kontekstual dari penerbangan token dengan mengasingkan kontribusi peringkat spesifik dokumen dan independen dokumen selama kompresi berdasarkan kodebook. Ini memungkinkan dekompresi online efektif dan memasukkan komposisi untuk relevan pencarian yang lebih baik. Kertas ini mempersembahkan evaluasi dari model representation token kompakt di atas dalam terma relevansi dan efisiensi ruang.', 'ko': 'Transformer 기반의 재배열 모델은 상하문에서 감지된 검색 표시와 문서 표시의 소프트 매칭을 통해 비교적 높은 검색 관련성을 실현할 수 있다.이러한 추리의 운행 시 복잡성을 줄이기 위해 이전의 작업은 미리 계산된 상하문 영패가 표시된 후기 상호작용 체계 구조를 사용했는데 그 대가는 대량의 온라인 저장이었다.본고는 코드본을 바탕으로 하는 압축 과정에서 특정한 문서와 문서에 독립된 정렬 공헌을 결합시켜 영패 삽입을 상하문량화하고자 한다.이것은 더 좋은 검색 관련성을 얻기 위해 효과적인 온라인 압축 해제와 삽입 합성을 허용한다.본고는 관련성과 공간 효율의 측면에서 상술한 긴축된 영패 표시 모델을 평가했다.', 'sq': 'Modelet e renditjes me bazë në transformues mund të arrijnë rëndësi të lartë kërkimi nëpërmjet përputhjes së lehtë me dokumentet në kontekst-në-dijeni. Për të lehtësuar kompleksitetin e një përfundimi të tillë, puna e mëparshme ka miratuar një arkitekturë ndërveprimi të vonuar me parallogaritje kontekstuale të shenjave me kosto të një magazinimi të madh në internet. Ky dokument propozon kuantizimin kontekstual të përfshirjeve të token duke shkëputur kontributet e renditjes specifike për dokumentet dhe të pavarura për dokumentet gjatë kompresimit bazuar në kodebook. Kjo lejon dekomprimin efektiv online dhe përfshirjen e kompozitave për rëndësi më të mirë kërkimi. Ky dokument paraqet një vlerësim të modelit të përfaqësimit të shenjave më të lartë kompakt lidhur me relevancën dhe efektshmërinë hapësire.', 'tr': 'Dönüştürme tabanlı tekrar sıralama modelleri tüketebilir. Sened işaretleri bilen ýokary arama önemini başarabilir. Çaltylyk zamanyň çykyşlygyny azaltmak üçin öňki işiň ön-hesaplanmış contextual möhümleriň online mazmunlaryň känesi üçin gijä bir arhitektura geçirdi. Bu kagyz sened spesifikaly we sened-täze derejesi kodegi tabanly komprimeýän wagtynda sened gaýşartmaklygyny teklip edýär Bu online faýly açylyp başarýar we gowy gözlemek üçin compositiýasyny daşartýar. Bu kağıt üstündeki kompakt işaretçilik model in in değerlendirmesini ve uzay etkinliği şeklinde gösterir.', 'af': "Name Om die hardlooptydskompleksiteit van sodanige inferensie te verminder, het die vorige werk 'n laat interaksie-arkitektuur aangeneem met voor-bereken contextual token voorstellings op die koste van 'n groot online opslaan. Hierdie papier voorstel contextual quantization of token inbêring deur dokument-spesifieke en dokument-onafhanklike rangeringsbydraaghings afkoppel tydens kodeboek-gebaseerde kompressie. Hierdie laat toe effektief aanlyn dekompresie en inbêer opstelling vir beter soektog relevansie. Hierdie papier stel 'n evaluering van die bo kompakte token voorstelling model in terms of relevance and space efficiency.", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች እንደነዚህ የሮን ሰዓት ውስጥነት ለማቅረብ፣ የቀድሞው ስራ አስቀድሞ የአካባቢ ግንኙነት መሠረት አስቀድሞ በተቆጠሩ አስቀድሞ ምልክቶች በተለየ ትልቅ የኢንተርኔት አካል ዋጋ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የኮድቡክ ክፍተት በተመሳሳይ ሰነድ-specific እና የሰነድ-ነፃ ደረጃዎች አካባቢዎችን በመጠቀም የአሁኑን ቁጥር ማሰናከል ያሳያል፡፡ ይህም የበለጠ መረብ ድምፅ እና የተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ለመፍለጋት ይችላል፡፡ ይህ ገጽ በላይኛው የአካባቢ ምልክት አካባቢ እና የስፍራው ውጤት ማድረግ ግንኙነት እና ምሳሌ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Փոփոխակերպման հիմնված վերադասակարգման մոդելները կարող են հասնել բարձր որոնման կարևորությունը, օգտագործելով կոնտեքստի գիտակցական փափուկ համեմատություն հարցերի նշանների հետ փաստաթղթերի նշաններով: Այսպիսի եզրակացության բարդությունը նվազեցնելու համար նախորդ աշխատանքը ընդունեց ուշ շփման ճարտարապետություն նախահաշվարկված կոնտեքստալ նշանների ներկայացումների հետ մեծ առցանց պահեստի արժեքը: This paper proposes contextual quantization of token embeddings by decoupling document-specific and document-independent ranking contributions during codebook-based compression.  Սա հնարավորություն է տալիս արդյունավետ առցանց քայքայման և համադրության ներառման ավելի լավ որոնման կարևորության համար: Այս փաստաթղթին ներկայացնում է վերևում կոմպեկտ նշանների ներկայացման մոդելի գնահատականը տիեզերքի կարևորության և արդյունավետության առումով:', 'bn': 'ট্রান্সফার্নারের ভিত্তিক পুনরায় র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং মডেল পুনরায় অনুসন্ধানের প্রাসঙ্গিক ক্ষেত্রের মাধ্যমে বেশী অনুসন্ এরকম অনলাইন সংরক্ষণের মূল্যে পূর্ববর্তী কাজের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিশাল অনলাইন সংরক্ষণের মূল্যে প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য একটি দেরি কর্ এই কাগজটি কোডেবুক ভিত্তিক সম্পাদনের সময় ডকুমেন্ট- নির্দিষ্ট এবং নথিপত্র-স্বাধীন রেঙ্কিং অংশগ্রহণের মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাব করেছে। This allows effective online decompression and embedding composition for better search relevance.  এই প্রবন্ধে উপরের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মডেলের মূল্য উপস্থাপন করেছে প্রাসঙ্গিক এবং স্থানের কার্যক্রমের মাধ্যমে।', 'ca': "Els models de re-classificació basats en transformadors poden aconseguir una alta pertinencia a la búsqueda a través de la comparació suau, conscient del context, de les fitxes de pregunta amb les fitxes de documentos. To alleviate runtime complexity of such inference, previous work has adopted a late interaction architecture with pre-computed contextual token representations at the cost of a large online storage.  Aquest paper propon quantificar contextualment les incorporacions de fitxes descoplant les contribucions de classement específices per documents i independents durant la compressió basada en el llibre de codis. Això permet la descompressió en línia efectiva i l'incorporació de la composició per a obtenir una millor pertinencia a la búsqueda. Aquest paper presenta una evaluació del model de representació compacte d'aquestes fitxes en termes de relevància i eficiència espacial.", 'cs': 'Modely přehodnocení založené na transformátorech mohou dosáhnout vysoké relevance vyhledávání díky kontextovému měkkému porovnání dotazových tokenů s tokeny dokumentů. Pro zmírnění runtime složitosti těchto inferencí předchozí práce přijala architekturu pozdní interakce s předem vypočítanými kontextovými reprezentacemi tokenů za cenu velkého online úložiště. Tento článek navrhuje kontextovou kvantizaci vkládání tokenů oddělením dokumentově specifických a dokumentově nezávislých žebříčků během komprese založené na kódové knize. To umožňuje efektivní online dekompresi a vložení kompozice pro lepší relevanci vyhledávání. Tento článek představuje hodnocení výše uvedeného modelu reprezentace kompaktních tokenů z hlediska relevance a účinnosti prostoru.', 'bs': 'Preobraćajući modeli ponovno reagiranja mogu postići važnost pretraživanja kroz kontekst-svestan meko odgovarajući znakovima pitanja sa znakovima dokumenta. Da bi se ublažila kompleksnost pokretanja takve infekcije, prethodni rad je usvojio kasnu arhitekturu interakcije sa predračunalnim kontekstualnim predstavljanjem znakova za cijenu velikog online skladišta. Ovaj papir predlaže kontekstualnu kvantizaciju ugrađenja znakova odključanjem doprinosa za specifične dokumente i nezavisnih redova na dokumentu tijekom kompresije na kodebovu. To omogućava učinkovitu online dekompresiju i ugrađivanje kompozicije za bolju relevantnost pretraživanja. Ovaj papir predstavlja procjenu modela predstavljanja iznad kompaktnih znakova u smislu relevantnosti i učinkovitosti svemira.', 'et': 'Transformeritel põhinevad ümberhindamise mudelid võivad saavutada suure otsingu asjakohasuse kontekstiteadliku päringutukenite pehme sobitamise kaudu dokumendimärkidega. Sellise järelduse käitusaja keerukuse leevendamiseks on varasemad tööd kasutusele võtnud hilise interaktsiooni arhitektuuri, millel on eelnevalt arvutatud kontekstuaalsed tokeni esitused suure võrgusalvestusruumi hinnaga. Käesolevas dokumendis pakutakse välja märkide manustamise kontekstiline kvantifitseerimine, lahutades dokumendipõhise ja dokumendisõltumatu järjestuse panused koodiraamatupõhise tihendamise ajal. See võimaldab tõhusat online dekompressiooni ja manustamist koostise paremaks otsingu asjakohasuseks. Käesolevas dokumendis esitatakse hinnang eespool nimetatud kompaktse märgi esitamise mudelile asjakohasuse ja ruumi tõhususe seisukohalt.', 'fi': 'Muuntajapohjaiset uudelleensijoitusmallit voivat saavuttaa korkean hakutarkoituksen kontekstitietoisen kyselymerkkien pehmeän yhdistämisen asiakirjamerkkien kanssa. Tällaisen päättelyn suorittamisajan monimutkaisuuden lieventämiseksi aikaisemmassa työssä on käytetty myöhäistä vuorovaikutusta koskevaa arkkitehtuuria, jossa on ennalta laskettuja kontekstuaalisia tunnuksia suuren verkkotallennuksen kustannuksella. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan token-upotusten kontekstuaalista kvantifiointia irrottamalla dokumenttikohtaiset ja dokumentti-riippumattomat sijoitukset koodakirjapohjaisen pakkaamisen aikana. Tämä mahdollistaa tehokkaan online-dekompression ja upotuksen koostumuksen paremman haun relevanssin saavuttamiseksi. Tässä artikkelissa esitetään arvio edellä mainitusta kompaktista tokenin esitysmallista relevanssin ja tilankäytön tehokkuuden kannalta.', 'az': 'Transformer tabanlı yeni səviyyə modelləri tərəfindən yüksək arama məqsədilə məlumatı ilə xəbərdarlıq məlumatı ilə məlumatların yumuşaqlı eşitməsini başa çata bilər. Bütün böyük xəstəliyin müxtəlif işləri azaltmaq üçün, əvvəlki işlər ön hesaplanmış müxtəlif möcüzələr ilə böyük online deposunun qiymətinə görə son bir müxtəlif arhitektura qəbul etdi. Bu kağıt kodu kitabı tabanlı kompresiyon sırasında belə dökümə müəyyən edilən və belə dökümə-bağımsız dəstək qiymətlərini dəstəkləyib təsirləndirir. Bu, daha yaxşı gözləmə müvəffəqiyyəti üçün müxtəlif online dekompresiyonu və kompozisyonu inşa edər. Bu kağıt üstündəki kompakt token göstəricisi model in in qiymətini ifadə edir.', 'jv': 'Transformer Ngubah rata nguasai perbudhakan langgar sampeyan karo akeh lanir Gambar iki supaya contextual limitation of token embedding politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Gambar iki bakal ngewehku nggambar aturan token sing wis nggambar cara-cara anyar tentang karo perusahaan og barang langgar.', 'sk': 'Modeli prerazvrščanja, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih, lahko dosežejo visoko ustreznost iskanja z mehkim ujemanjem žetonov poizvedbe z žetoni dokumentov, ki se zavedajo konteksta. Za zmanjšanje kompleksnosti takega sklepanja v času izvajanja je bilo v prejšnjem delu sprejeto arhitekturo pozne interakcije z vnaprej izračunanimi kontekstualnimi predstavitvami žetonov na račun velikega spletnega shranjevanja. Ta prispevek predlaga kontekstno kvantizacijo vdelav žetonov z ločevanjem prispevkov, specifičnih za dokumente in neodvisnih za dokumente, med stiskanjem na podlagi kodnih knjig. To omogoča učinkovito spletno dekompresijo in vdelavo sestave za boljšo ustreznost iskanja. V prispevku je predstavljena ocena zgoraj navedenega modela kompaktnega predstavitve žetonov v smislu relevantnosti in prostorske učinkovitosti.', 'ha': "@ action: button To, sauƙi da adadin tafiyar lokaci na wannan kasa, aiki na farko ya zãɓi wani late interaction architecture with pre-ƙidãyayd intractical tags wakilishions at the price of a larger adanar net. Wannan takardar ɗin na ƙayyade gwargwadon tsari na embeddinga cikin shirin ayuka da za'a buƙata yin takardar-ƙayyade da takardar-da-dokuman-da-da-da-inganci da ranar randin rassi a lokacin da aka danne shi na littãfin. Wannan yana yarda da alama masu amfani da kwamfyuta zaɓen raɗabi'a masu amfani da kuma ana shigar da composition dõmin masu amfani da masu amfani da kwamfyuta search. Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani qiymati na salon mai nuna shi a saman sami cikin masu hushi da amfani da fassarar space.", 'he': 'דוגמני שינוי המבוססים במעבר יכולים להשיג רלוונטיות חיפוש גבוהה דרך התאמה רכה מודעת לקונקסט של סימני חיפוש עם סימני מסמכים. כדי להקל על מורכבות הזמן של המסקנה הזאת, העבודה הקודמת אימצה ארכיטקטורת אינטראקציה מאוחרת עם מייצגי סימנים קונטקסטיים מחשבים מראש במחיר של אחסון ברשת גדול. המסמך הזה מציע קונטיקציה קונטוקטואלית של תוספות סימנים על ידי פירוק תרומות מדרגה מסמכים ספציפיים ומסמכים עצמאיים במהלך הלחץ מסמכי קוד. זה מאפשר פיצוץ יעיל באינטרנט ולהכניס רישוי חיפוש טוב יותר. העבודה הזו מציגה עריכה של מודל ההצגה של סימנים קומפקטים גבוה במונחים של רלוונטיות ויעילות חלל.', 'bo': 'Transformer based re-ranking models can achieve high search relevance through context- aware soft matching of query tokens with document tokens. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་འགྱུར་བའི་དུས་ཚོད་དཀའ་ངལ This paper proposes contextual quantization of token embeddings by decoupling document-specific and document-independent ranking contributions during codebook-based compression. འདིས་ཕན་ཚུན་འབྲེལ་དྲ་བ་མཆོང་བཤེར་དང་ནང་འདྲེན་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལེགས་བྱེད་ནུས་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མདུན་ཁང་གི་དཔེ་རིགས་བཀོད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་ཉེ་བ་དང་བར་སྟོང་རྩལ་བ་སྟོན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོ'}
{'en': 'TruthfulQA Measuring How Models Mimic Human Falsehoods', 'fr': 'Arrêt anticipé basé sur des échantillons non étiquetés dans la classification de texte', 'pt': 'Parada antecipada com base em amostras não rotuladas na classificação de texto', 'ja': 'テキスト分類における未標識試料に基づく早期停止', 'ar': 'التوقف المبكر بناءً على عينات غير مصنفة في تصنيف النص', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण में लेबल न किए गए नमूनों के आधार पर प्रारंभिक रोक', 'zh': '盖文本分类中未记样本之先止也', 'ru': 'Ранняя остановка на основании немеченных образцов в классификации текста', 'es': 'Detención temprana basada en muestras no etiquetadas en la clasificación de texto', 'ga': 'Stopadh Luath Bunaithe ar Shamplaí Neamhlipéadaithe in Aicmiú Téacs', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში წინასწარმოდგენელი მონაცემების ბაზაზე', 'hu': 'Korai leállítás címke nélküli minták alapján a szövegosztályozásban', 'el': 'Πρώιμη διακοπή με βάση τα μη επισημασμένα δείγματα στην ταξινόμηση κειμένου', 'it': 'Arresto precoce basato su campioni non etichettati nella classificazione del testo', 'lt': 'Ankstyvas sustojimas pagal teksto klasifikacijos nenustatytus pavyzdžius', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификациясындағы ерекшелмеген үлгілеріне негізделген алдыңғы тоқтату', 'mk': 'Претходно запирање базирано на необележани примероци во класификацијата на текст', 'ms': 'Hentikan Awal Berdasarkan Sampel Tidak Ditanda dalam Klasifikasi Teks', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസിഷനേഷനില്\u200d അല്ലാത്ത മാമ്പുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നിര്\u200dത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Twaqqif bikri bbażat fuq Kampjuni Mhux Tikkettati fil-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test', 'mn': 'Текст классификацийн анхны зогсох', 'no': 'tidlegare stopping basert på ulike eksemplar i tekstklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'Wczesne zatrzymywanie na podstawie nieoznakowanych próbek w klasyfikacji tekstu', 'ro': 'Oprirea timpurie bazată pe eșantioane fără etichete în clasificarea textelor', 'sr': 'Rano stajanje temeljeno na nezabeliranim primerima u klasifikaciji teksta', 'so': 'Jabshaha hore', 'si': 'පළවෙනි නවත්තන්න පාළුවන් විශේෂණයේ නැති නිර්මාණය සඳහා', 'sv': 'Tidigt stopp baserat på obemärkta prov i textklassificering', 'ur': 'پاکستان کلاسیفٹ میں بغیر پڑھی نمونے پر بنیاد رکھا گیا', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தலில் இல்லாத மாதிரிகளை அடிப்படையாக நிறுத்து', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Ngưng trước dựa trên mẫu không được dán nhãn', 'da': 'Tidligt standsning baseret på ikke-mærkede prøver i tekstklassifikation', 'de': 'Frühzeitiges Stoppen basierend auf nicht beschrifteten Beispielen in der Textklassifizierung', 'hr': 'Rano stajanje temeljeno na neizbiljnim uzorcima u klasifikaciji teksta', 'bg': 'Ранно спиране въз основа на немаркирани проби в класификацията на текста', 'nl': 'Vroeg stoppen op basis van niet-gelabelde monsters in tekstclassificatie', 'ko': '텍스트 분류에서 표시되지 않은 샘플의 초기 정지 기반', 'fa': 'جلوگیری اولیه بر روی نمونه\u200cهای نامزدی در کلاس متن', 'sw': 'Mifano zisizo na maandamano', 'id': 'Hentikan Awal Berdasarkan Sampel Belum Berabel dalam Klasifikasi Teks', 'af': 'Vroeg Stopping Basies op Onabelde Bispille in Teks Klassifikasie', 'hy': 'Տեքստի դասակարգման առանց նշանների հիմնված վաղ դադարում', 'sq': 'Ndaloje e hershme bazuar në shembuj të pashkruar në klasifikimin e tekstit', 'tr': 'Metin Sözlemekde Iňki Saklamak Buýruky', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'bs': 'Rano stajanje temeljeno na neizbiljnim primjerima u klasifikaciji teksta', 'bn': 'টেক্সট ক্লাসিফেশনে অসম্ভব নমুনা বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক স্থাপন করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Detenció precoce basada en mostres no marcats en la classificació del text', 'az': 'M톛tn S캼n캼f캼s캼nda 쿮vv톛lki Durma 칐rnekl톛rin톛 dayanan', 'cs': 'Včasné zastavení na základě neoznačených vzorků v klasifikaci textu', 'et': 'Varajane peatamine tekstiklassifikatsioonis märgistamata näidiste põhjal', 'fi': 'Varhainen lopettaminen tekstiluokituksen merkitsemättömien näytteiden perusteella', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Zgodnje ustavitev na podlagi neoznačenih vzorcev v klasifikaciji besedila', 'he': 'Early Stopping Based on Unlabeled Samples in Text Classification', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'མ་ཤེས་པའི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་རིས་ཡིག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བཞག་པའི་སྔོན་མེད་མཚམས་འཇོག་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'We propose a benchmark to measure whether a language model is truthful in generating answers to questions The benchmark comprises questions that span categories including health law finance and politics We crafted questions that some humans would answer falsely due to a false belief or misconception To perform well models must avoid generating false answers learned from imitating human texts We tested GPT-3 GPT Neo J GPT-2 and a T5 based model The best model was truthful on of questions while human performance was Models generated many false answers that mimic popular misconceptions and have the potential to deceive humans The largest models were generally the least truthful This contrasts with other NLP tasks where performance improves with model size However this result is expected if false answers are learned from the training distribution We suggest that scaling up models alone is less promising for improving truthfulness than fine tuning using training objectives other than imitation of text from the web', 'fr': "L'arrêt anticipé, qui est largement utilisé pour prévenir le surajustement, est généralement basé sur un ensemble de validation distinct. Toutefois, dans les environnements à faibles ressources, l'arrêt basé sur la validation peut être risqué car un petit ensemble de validation peut ne pas être suffisamment représentatif, et la réduction du nombre d'échantillons par division de validation peut entraîner une insuffisance d'échantillons pour la formation. Dans cette étude, nous proposons une méthode d'arrêt précoce qui utilise des échantillons non étiquetés. La méthode proposée est basée sur les similitudes de confiance et de distribution de classe. Pour améliorer encore les performances, nous présentons une méthode d'étalonnage permettant de mieux estimer la distribution de classe des échantillons non marqués. Le procédé proposé est avantageux car il ne nécessite pas de jeu de validation séparé et fournit un meilleur point d'arrêt en utilisant un grand ensemble non étiqueté. Des expériences approfondies sont menées sur cinq ensembles de données de classification de texte et plusieurs méthodes d'arrêt sont comparées. Nos résultats montrent que le modèle proposé est même plus performant que l'utilisation d'un ensemble de validation supplémentaire ainsi que des méthodes d'arrêt existantes, à la fois dans des paramètres de données équilibrées et déséquilibrées. Notre code est disponible sur https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.", 'ar': 'يعتمد التوقف المبكر ، والذي يستخدم على نطاق واسع لمنع فرط التجهيز ، بشكل عام على مجموعة تحقق منفصلة. ومع ذلك ، في ظروف الموارد المنخفضة ، يمكن أن يكون التوقف المستند إلى التحقق محفوفًا بالمخاطر لأن مجموعة التحقق الصغيرة قد لا تكون ممثلة بشكل كافٍ ، وقد يؤدي تقليل عدد العينات عن طريق تقسيم التحقق إلى عينات غير كافية للتدريب. في هذه الدراسة ، نقترح طريقة إيقاف مبكرة تستخدم عينات غير مسماة. الطريقة المقترحة مبنية على الثقة والتشابه في التوزيع الطبقي. لزيادة تحسين الأداء ، نقدم طريقة معايرة لتقدير توزيع فئة العينات غير المسماة بشكل أفضل. تعتبر الطريقة المقترحة مفيدة لأنها لا تتطلب مجموعة تحقق منفصلة وتوفر نقطة توقف أفضل باستخدام مجموعة كبيرة غير مصنفة. يتم إجراء تجارب مكثفة على خمس مجموعات بيانات لتصنيف النص ومقارنة عدة طرق توقف. تظهر نتائجنا أن النموذج المقترح يعمل بشكل أفضل من استخدام مجموعة تحقق إضافية بالإضافة إلى طرق التوقف الحالية ، في كل من إعدادات البيانات المتوازنة وغير المتوازنة. الكود الخاص بنا متاح على https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'es': 'La detención temprana, que se usa ampliamente para evitar el sobreajuste, generalmente se basa en un conjunto de validación separado. Sin embargo, en entornos de bajos recursos, la detención basada en la validación puede ser riesgosa porque un conjunto de validación pequeño puede no ser lo suficientemente representativo, y la reducción en el número de muestras por división de validación puede resultar en muestras insuficientes para el entrenamiento. En este estudio, proponemos un método de parada temprana que utiliza muestras no etiquetadas. El método propuesto se basa en las similitudes de confianza y distribución de clases. Para mejorar aún más el rendimiento, presentamos un método de calibración para estimar mejor la distribución de clases de las muestras no etiquetadas. El método propuesto es ventajoso porque no requiere un conjunto de validación separado y proporciona un mejor punto de parada mediante el uso de un conjunto grande sin etiqueta. Se realizan experimentos exhaustivos en cinco conjuntos de datos de clasificación de texto y se comparan varios métodos de parada. Nuestros resultados muestran que el modelo propuesto funciona incluso mejor que el uso de un conjunto de validación adicional, así como los métodos de detención existentes, tanto en configuraciones de datos equilibrados como desequilibrados. Nuestro código está disponible en https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ja': 'オーバーフィッティングを防ぐために広く使用されている早期停止は、一般に別の検証セットに基づいています。 しかしながら、低リソース設定では、小さな検証セットが十分に代表的でない可能性があるため、検証ベースの停止はリスクがあり、検証分割によるサンプル数の削減は、トレーニングのためのサンプルが不十分になる可能性があります。 本研究では、未標識試料を用いた早期停止法を提案する。 提案された方法は、信頼性とクラス分布の類似性に基づいている。 さらにパフォーマンスを向上させるために、標識されていないサンプルのクラス分布をよりよく推定するための較正方法を提示します。 提案された方法は、別個の検証セットを必要とせず、大きな非標識セットを使用することによってより良い停止点を提供するため、有利である。 ５つのテキスト分類データセットについて広範な実験を行い、いくつかの停止方法を比較する。 私たちの結果は、提案されたモデルは、バランスの取れたデータ設定とアンバランスなデータ設定の両方で、追加の検証セットと既存のストップメソッドを使用するよりもさらに優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。 コードはhttps://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stopから入手できます。', 'pt': 'A parada antecipada, que é amplamente usada para evitar overfitting, geralmente é baseada em um conjunto de validação separado. No entanto, em configurações de poucos recursos, a parada baseada em validação pode ser arriscada porque um pequeno conjunto de validação pode não ser suficientemente representativo e a redução no número de amostras por divisão de validação pode resultar em amostras insuficientes para treinamento. Neste estudo, propomos um método de parada antecipada que utiliza amostras não rotuladas. O método proposto é baseado em semelhanças de confiança e distribuição de classes. Para melhorar ainda mais o desempenho, apresentamos um método de calibração para melhor estimar a distribuição de classes das amostras não rotuladas. O método proposto é vantajoso porque não requer um conjunto de validação separado e fornece um melhor ponto de parada usando um grande conjunto não rotulado. Extensos experimentos são conduzidos em cinco conjuntos de dados de classificação de texto e vários métodos de parada são comparados. Nossos resultados mostram que o modelo proposto tem um desempenho ainda melhor do que usar um conjunto de validação adicional, bem como os métodos de parada existentes, tanto em configurações de dados balanceadas quanto desbalanceadas. Nosso código está disponível em https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'zh': '早停(广以防过度拟合)常基于独验集。 然低资源之设也,验止或险,小验集或不足代表性,且验拆分损样本或致样本不足以训也。 于此论之,一用未标样本早期停法。 其法盖置信度类布相似性。 为进一步提高性能,立一校准法,以度未识样品之类。 其法有胜势,以其不须独验集,而资以大形未集之善。 博采五实验,较之数停。 臣等之的结果表明,于衡与不平之数置中,其模形至比用额外验集及见止之法尤善。 吾代码可 https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop。', 'hi': 'प्रारंभिक रोक, जो व्यापक रूप से ओवरफिटिंग को रोकने के लिए उपयोग किया जाता है, आमतौर पर एक अलग सत्यापन सेट पर आधारित होता है। हालाँकि, कम संसाधन सेटिंग्स में, सत्यापन-आधारित रोक जोखिम भरा हो सकता है क्योंकि एक छोटा सत्यापन सेट पर्याप्त रूप से प्रतिनिधि नहीं हो सकता है, और सत्यापन विभाजन द्वारा नमूनों की संख्या में कमी के परिणामस्वरूप प्रशिक्षण के लिए अपर्याप्त नमूने हो सकते हैं। इस अध्ययन में, हम एक प्रारंभिक रोकने की विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो बिना लेबल वाले नमूनों का उपयोग करता है। प्रस्तावित विधि आत्मविश्वास और वर्ग वितरण समानताओं पर आधारित है। प्रदर्शन को और बेहतर बनाने के लिए, हम बिना लेबल वाले नमूनों के वर्ग वितरण का बेहतर अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक अंशांकन विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। प्रस्तावित विधि लाभप्रद है क्योंकि इसे एक अलग सत्यापन सेट की आवश्यकता नहीं है और एक बड़े अनलेबल सेट का उपयोग करके एक बेहतर स्टॉपिंग पॉइंट प्रदान करता है। पांच पाठ वर्गीकरण डेटासेट पर व्यापक प्रयोग किए जाते हैं और कई स्टॉप-विधियों की तुलना की जाती है। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल संतुलित और असंतुलित डेटा सेटिंग्स दोनों में एक अतिरिक्त सत्यापन सेट के साथ-साथ मौजूदा स्टॉप-विधियों का उपयोग करने से भी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। हमारा कोड https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop पर उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Ранняя остановка, которая широко используется для предотвращения переобустройства, обычно основывается на отдельном наборе валидации. Тем не менее, при низких настройках ресурсов остановка на основе валидации может быть рискованной, поскольку небольшой набор валидации может быть недостаточно репрезентативным, а сокращение количества образцов путем разделения валидации может привести к недостаточному количеству образцов для обучения. В этом исследовании мы предлагаем метод ранней остановки, который использует немеченые образцы. Предложенный метод основан на сходствах доверительного распределения и распределения по классам. Для дальнейшего улучшения эксплуатационных характеристик мы предлагаем метод калибровки для лучшей оценки распределения классов немаркированных образцов. Предложенный метод является предпочтительным, поскольку он не требует отдельного набора валидации и обеспечивает лучшую точку остановки при использовании большого немеченного набора. Проводятся обширные эксперименты с пятью наборами данных классификации текста и сравниваются несколько стоп-методов. Наши результаты показывают, что предлагаемая модель даже лучше, чем использование дополнительного набора валидации, а также существующих стоп-методов, как в сбалансированных, так и в несбалансированных настройках данных. Наш код доступен по адресу https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ga': 'Tá stad luath, a úsáidtear go forleathan chun ró-fheistiú a chosc, bunaithe go ginearálta ar thacar bailíochtaithe ar leith. I suímh acmhainní ísle, áfach, is féidir go mbeadh riosca ag baint le stopadh bunaithe ar bhailíochtú toisc go bhféadfadh sé nach mbeadh tacar bailíochtaithe beag ionadaíoch a dhóthain, agus d’fhéadfadh go laghdófar líon na samplaí de réir scoilte bailíochtaithe nach leor samplaí le haghaidh oiliúna. Sa staidéar seo, molaimid modh stopála luath a úsáideann samplaí gan lipéad. Tá an modh atá beartaithe bunaithe ar mhuinín agus cosúlachtaí dáileacháin aicme. Chun an fheidhmíocht a fheabhsú tuilleadh, cuirimid modh calabraithe i láthair chun meastachán níos fearr a dhéanamh ar dháileadh ranga na samplaí gan lipéad. Tá an modh atá beartaithe buntáisteach toisc nach bhfuil tacar bailíochtaithe ar leith ag teastáil uaidh agus go soláthraíonn sé pointe stoptha níos fearr trí thacar mór gan lipéad a úsáid. Déantar turgnaimh fhairsing ar chúig thacar sonraí aicmithe téacs agus déantar comparáid idir roinnt stadanna. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfeidhmíonn an tsamhail mholta níos fearr fós ná úsáid a bhaint as tacar bailíochtaithe breise chomh maith leis na stop-mhodhanna atá ann cheana féin, i socruithe sonraí cothromaithe agus éagothroma. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'hu': 'A korai leállítás, amelyet széles körben használnak a túlterhelés megakadályozására, általában külön validálási készleten alapul. Alacsony erőforrások esetén azonban kockázatos lehet az érvényesítésen alapuló leállítás, mivel egy kis érvényesítési készlet nem kellően reprezentatív, és a minták számának az érvényesítési felosztással történő csökkenése a képzéshez nem elégséges mintát eredményezhet. Ebben a tanulmányban egy korai leállítási módszert javasolunk, amely címke nélküli mintákat használ. A javasolt módszer a konfidencia és osztályeloszlás hasonlóságain alapul. A teljesítmény további javítása érdekében bemutatunk egy kalibrálási módszert, amely jobban becsüli a címke nélküli minták osztályeloszlását. A javasolt módszer előnyös, mivel nem igényel külön érvényesítési készletet, és jobb megállópontot biztosít egy nagy, címke nélküli készlet használatával. Öt szövegosztályozási adatkészleten kiterjedt kísérleteket végeznek, és több stop-módszert hasonlítanak össze. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell még jobban teljesít, mint egy kiegészítő validálási készlet, valamint a meglévő stop-módszerek használata, kiegyensúlyozott és kiegyensúlyozatlan adatbeállításokban. A kódunk elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ka': 'პირველი დასრულება, რომელიც ძალიან გამოყენებულია დასაწყებლად გადასრულებლად, უფრო განსხვავებული გადასრულება დაბათებულია. მაგრამ, ცოტა რესურსის პარამეტრებში, გადაწყვეტილების გადაწყვეტილება შეიძლება იყოს რისიკური, რადგან პატარა გადაწყვეტილება შეიძლება არ იყოს სამართლოდ რესპენტირება, და გადაწყვეტილების გადაწყვეტილების რაო ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ წარმოდგინეთ წარმოდგინე მეტი, რომელიც გამოიყენება არაფერი წარმოდგინული მონაცემები. პროგრამის შესაძლებელი პროგრამი იქნება დარწმუნება და კლასის განყოფილების განსხვავებაზე. უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ პროგრამის შესაძლებელი მეტი იქნება, რადგან ის არ მოჭირდება განსაკუთრებული გადაწყვეტილების კონფიგურაცია და უფრო უკეთესი გადაწყვეტილების კონფიგურაცია, რო პარამეტრებული ექსპერიმენტები ხუთი ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გავაკეთება და რამდენიმე დასრულების მეტი შედგ ჩვენი წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო უკეთესი გავაკეთებს, ვიდრე დამატებული გავაკეთება დასრულებული მოდენტის გამოყენება და მუშაობელი დასრულებული მოდენტის მონაცემებში ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'el': 'Η έγκαιρη διακοπή, η οποία χρησιμοποιείται ευρέως για την πρόληψη της υπερπροσαρμογής, βασίζεται γενικά σε ένα ξεχωριστό σύνολο επικύρωσης. Ωστόσο, σε χαμηλές ρυθμίσεις πόρων, η διακοπή με βάση την επικύρωση μπορεί να είναι επικίνδυνη επειδή ένα μικρό σύνολο επικύρωσης μπορεί να μην είναι επαρκώς αντιπροσωπευτικό και η μείωση του αριθμού των δειγμάτων από τη διάσπαση επικύρωσης μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε ανεπαρκή δείγματα για εκπαίδευση. Στην παρούσα μελέτη, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο έγκαιρης διακοπής που χρησιμοποιεί δείγματα χωρίς σήμανση. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βασίζεται σε ομοιότητες εμπιστοσύνης και κατανομής τάξεων. Για περαιτέρω βελτίωση της απόδοσης, παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο βαθμονόμησης για την καλύτερη εκτίμηση της κατανομής κλάσης των δειγμάτων χωρίς ετικέτα. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος είναι πλεονεκτική επειδή δεν απαιτεί ξεχωριστό σύνολο επικύρωσης και παρέχει καλύτερο σημείο διακοπής χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μεγάλο σύνολο χωρίς σήμανση. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα διεξάγονται σε πέντε σύνολα δεδομένων ταξινόμησης κειμένου και συγκρίνονται διάφορες μέθοδοι στάσεων. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο αποδίδει ακόμη καλύτερα από τη χρήση ενός πρόσθετου συνόλου επικύρωσης καθώς και των υφιστάμενων μεθόδων στάσεων, τόσο σε ισορροπημένες όσο και σε ανισορροπημένες ρυθμίσεις δεδομένων. Ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'it': "L'arresto precoce, ampiamente utilizzato per prevenire il sovradimensionamento, si basa generalmente su un set di convalida separato. Tuttavia, nelle impostazioni a basso contenuto di risorse, l'arresto basato sulla convalida può essere rischioso perché un piccolo set di convalida potrebbe non essere sufficientemente rappresentativo e la riduzione del numero di campioni mediante la suddivisione della convalida può comportare campioni insufficienti per la formazione. In questo studio, proponiamo un metodo di arresto precoce che utilizza campioni non etichettati. Il metodo proposto si basa su confidenza e somiglianze di distribuzione di classe. Per migliorare ulteriormente le prestazioni, presentiamo un metodo di taratura per stimare meglio la distribuzione di classe dei campioni non etichettati. Il metodo proposto è vantaggioso perché non richiede un set di convalida separato e fornisce un punto di arresto migliore utilizzando un set di grandi dimensioni senza etichetta. Vengono condotti esperimenti approfonditi su cinque set di dati di classificazione del testo e vengono confrontati diversi metodi di stop. I nostri risultati mostrano che il modello proposto ha prestazioni migliori rispetto all'utilizzo di un set di validazione aggiuntivo e dei metodi di stop esistenti, sia in impostazioni bilanciate che sbilanciate dei dati. Il nostro codice è disponibile all'indirizzo https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.", 'kk': 'Бірінші тоқтату, бұл үлкен қолданылатын, әдетте бөлек тексеру бағдарламасына негізделген. Бірақ баптаулары төмен ресурстар баптауларында тексеру негізінде тоқтату тәртіпсіздігі мүмкін, себебі кішкентай тексеру баптаулары жеткілікті емес болуы мүмкін, және тексеру үшін үлгілер санын азату мүмкін, оқыту үшін қа Бұл зерттеулерде, мәліметтерді қолдануға артқылы тоқтату әдісін таңдаймыз. Келтірілген әдіс сенімді және клас үлестірімінің ұқсастығына негізделген. Жұмыс істеу үшін біз калибрлеу әдісін жақсы оқу үшін класс үлестіріміздің үлестіріміздің үлестірімізді жақсы оқу үшін таңдаймыз. Келтірілген әдіс бөлек тексеру баптауы керек емес және үлкен келтірілмеген баптау баптауларын қолдануға арналған үлкен тоқтату нүктесін жеткізеді. Бес мәтін классификациялау деректер қорларында кеңейтілген тәжірибелер және бірнеше тоқтату әдістері салыстырылады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз келтірілген үлгі қосымша тексеру және қосымша тоқтату әдістерін, балансирован және балансирован деректер параметрлерінде қолданудың жақсы жұмысын көрсетеді. Біздің кодмыз бар https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'mk': 'Претходното запирање, кое е широко употребено за спречување на премногу пристапување, генерално се базира на одделен валидациски сет. Сепак, во поставувањата со ниски ресурси, прекинувањата базирани на валидација може да бидат ризични бидејќи малиот сет на валидација можеби не е доволно репрезентативен, а намалувањето на бројот на примероци со поделба на валидација може да резултира со недоволни примероци Во оваа студија, предложуваме метод на рано запирање кој користи необележани примероци. Предложениот метод се базира на доверба и сличности на распределбата на класата. За понатамошно подобрување на резултатите, претставуваме метод на калибрација за подобра проценка на распределбата на класата на непозначените примероци. The proposed method is advantageous because it does not require a separate validation set and provides a better stopping point by using a large unlabeled set.  Експериментите се спроведуваат на пет набори на податоци за класификација на текст и се споредуваат неколку методи на запирање. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека предложениот модел дури и функционира подобро отколку користејќи дополнителен валидациски сет, како и постојните методи на запирање, во балансирани и небалансирани поставувања на податоци. Нашиот код е достапен на https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ms': 'Hentikan awal, yang digunakan secara luas untuk mencegah overfitting, secara umum berdasarkan set pengesahihan terpisah. Namun, dalam tetapan sumber rendah, penghentian berdasarkan pengesahihan boleh berbahaya kerana set pengesahihan kecil mungkin tidak cukup mewakili, dan pengurangan bilangan sampel dengan bahagian pengesahihan mungkin menyebabkan sampel yang tidak cukup untuk latihan. Dalam kajian ini, kami cadangkan kaedah berhenti awal yang menggunakan sampel tidak berlebihan. Kaedah yang diusulkan berdasarkan kepercayaan dan persamaan distribusi kelas. Untuk memperbaiki prestasi lebih lanjut, kami memperkenalkan kaedah kalibrasi untuk memperkirakan lebih baik distribusi kelas sampel yang tidak berlebihan. Kaedah yang diusulkan adalah keuntungan kerana ia tidak memerlukan set pengesahihan terpisah dan menyediakan titik berhenti yang lebih baik dengan menggunakan set besar yang tidak ditabel. Eksperimen luas dilakukan pada lima set data pengeklasifikasi teks dan beberapa kaedah-hentian dibandingkan. Keputusan kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang direncanakan bahkan berfungsi lebih baik daripada menggunakan set pengesahihan tambahan serta kaedah-hentian yang wujud, dalam kedua-dua tetapan data yang seimbang dan tidak seimbang. Kod kita tersedia di https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'lt': 'Early stopping, which is widely used to prevent overfitting, is generally based on a separate validation set.  Vis dėlto mažai išteklių turint gali būti pavojinga sustabdyti patvirtinimą, nes mažas patvirtinimo rinkinys gali būti nepakankamai reprezentatyvus, o mėginių skaičiaus sumažėjimas padalijus patvirtinimą gali sukelti nepakankamą mėginių mokymui atlikti. Šiame tyrime siūlome ankstyvo sustabdymo metodą, kuriuo naudojami nenustatyti mėginiai. Siūlomas metodas grindžiamas pasitikėjimu ir klasės pasiskirstymo panašumu. Siekiant toliau gerinti veiksmingumą, mes pateikiame kalibravimo metodą, kuriuo geriau įvertinamas nenustatytų mėginių klasės pasiskirstymas. Siūlomas metodas yra naudingas, nes jis nereikalauja atskiro patvirtinimo rinkinio ir suteikia geresnį sustabdymo tašką naudojant didelį nesuženklintą rinkinį. Extensive experiments are conducted on five text classification datasets and several stop-methods are compared.  Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas modelis veikia net geriau nei naudojant papildomą patvirtinimo rinkinį ir esamus sustabdymo metodus, tiek subalansuotuose, tiek disbalansuotuose duomenise. Mūsų kodas pateikiamas https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'mt': 'It-twaqqif bikri, li jintuża ħafna biex jipprevjeni t-twaħħil żejjed, huwa ġeneralment ibbażat fuq sett ta’ validazzjoni separat. Madankollu, f’ambjenti ta’ riżorsi baxxi, waqfien ibbażat fuq il-validazzjoni jista’ jkun riskjuż minħabba li sett żgħir ta’ validazzjoni jista’ ma jkunx rappreżentattiv biżżejjed, u t-tnaqqis fin-numru ta’ kampjuni permezz ta’ qsim tal-validazzjoni jista’ jirriżulta f’kampjuni insuffiċjenti għat-taħriġ. In this study, we propose an early stopping method that uses unlabeled samples.  Il-metodu propost huwa bbażat fuq similaritajiet ta’ kunfidenza u distribuzzjoni tal-klassi. Biex itejbu aktar il-prestazzjoni, nippreżentaw metodu ta’ kalibrazzjoni biex nistmaw a ħjar id-distribuzzjoni tal-klassi tal-kampjuni mingħajr tikketta. Il-metodu propost huwa vantaġġuż għaliex ma jeħtieġx sett separat ta’ validazzjoni u jipprovdi punt ta’ waqfien a ħjar billi juża sett kbir mingħajr tikketta. Jitwettqu esperimenti estensivi fuq ħames settijiet ta’ dejta tal-klassifikazzjoni tat-test u jitqabblu diversi metodi ta’ waqfien. Our results show that the proposed model even performs better than using an additional validation set as well as the existing stop-methods, in both balanced and imbalanced data settings.  Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'mn': 'Эртний зогсолт, ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгдэхийг зогсоохын тулд ихэвчлэн ашигладаг, ихэвчлэн ялгаатай шалгалтын багц дээр байдаг. Гэхдээ бага баялаг нөөц тохиолдолд, шалгалтын үндсэн зогсолт эрсдэлтэй байж болно. Учир нь жижиг шалгалтын тохиолдол хангалттай байж болохгүй, шалгалтын тоо багасгах нь багасгах боломжтой. Энэ судалгаанд бид анхны зогсоох арга замыг ашигладаг. Хувь итгэл, хичээлийн хуваарилалтын төстэй төстэй байдаг. Үүнийг илүү сайжруулахын тулд бид хичээлийн хуваарилалтыг илүү сайжруулахын тулд калибрын арга зам өгдөг. Энэ санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь үнэ цэнэтэй, учир нь энэ нь ялгаатай шийдвэрлэлтийг шаардаггүй бөгөөд том шийдвэрлэгдэхгүй суурь ашиглан илүү сайн зогсоох цэгийг хангадаг. Өнгөрсөн туршилтууд таван текст хэлбэрийн өгөгдлийн санд хийгддэг ба хэд хэдэн зогсоох аргыг харьцуулдаг. Бидний үр дүнд санал өгсөн загвар нь нэмэлт шалгалтыг ашиглахаас ч илүү сайн хийдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний код нь https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'no': 'Tidsfør stopping, som er breidd brukt for å hindra overpassing, er generelt basert på eit eigne valeringssett. I låge ressursinnstillingar kan imidlertid avslutting på validasjonsbasert vera riskisk, fordi ein liten validasjonsstatt kan ikkje vera nok reprezentativ, og reduksjonen i antallet prøver ved å dele av validasjon kan føre til feil prøver for opplæring. I denne studien foreslår vi ein tidlegare stopping metode som brukar ugjennomsiktige prøver. Dette første metoden er basert på tiltrudd og klassefordelingsliknande. For å forbetra utviklinga, presenterer vi ein kalibreringsmetode for å bedre estimere klassedistribusjonen av dei ulike prøver. Den foreslåde metoden er nyttig fordi den ikkje krev ei eigen validatingssett og tilbyr ein bedre stopppunkt ved å bruka ein stor ikkje merkelig sett. Eksperimentar vert utvida på fem tekstklassifikasjonsdata og fleire stopmetodar vert samanlikna. Resultatet våra viser at den foreslåde modellen utfører til og med ein ekstra validasjon, og dei eksisterande stopmetodane, både balanserte og ulike datainnstillingane. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ml': 'ആദ്യമായി നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന നിര്\u200dത്തുന്നതു്, അതിനു് വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതു്, സാധാരണ വ്യത്യസ്ത ത തിരിച്ചറി എങ്കിലും കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d, വ്യാജത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നിര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന് അപകടത്തിലായിരിക്കും കാരണം ഒരു ചെറിയ വിധിയുടെ സെറ്റിന്റെ പ്രതി ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നേരത്തെ നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d ആശ്വാസവും ക്ലാസിന്റെ വിതരണ സമമാണ്. കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാബിബര്\u200dഷന്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ക്ലാസ് വിതരണം കൂടുതല്\u200d ചെയ്യാ The proposed method is advantageous because it does not require a separate validation set and provides a better stopping point by using a large unlabeled set.  അഞ്ചു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കുറച് നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. നിലവി Our code is available at  https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'pl': 'Wczesne zatrzymywanie się, które jest szeroko stosowane w celu zapobiegania nadmiernemu dopasowaniu, opiera się zazwyczaj na osobnym zestawie walidacji. Jednakże w ustawieniach o niskim poziomie zasobów zatrzymanie oparte na walidacji może być ryzykowne, ponieważ mały zestaw walidacji może nie być wystarczająco reprezentatywny, a zmniejszenie liczby próbek poprzez podział walidacji może skutkować niewystarczającą ilością próbek do szkolenia. W niniejszym badaniu proponujemy metodę wczesnego zatrzymywania, która wykorzystuje nieoznakowane próbki. Proponowana metoda opiera się na zaufaniu i podobieństwach rozkładu klas. Aby jeszcze bardziej poprawić wydajność, przedstawiamy metodę kalibracji pozwalającą lepiej oszacować rozkład klasy nieoznakowanych próbek. Proponowana metoda jest korzystna, ponieważ nie wymaga oddzielnego zestawu walidacji i zapewnia lepszy punkt zatrzymania dzięki zastosowaniu dużego zestawu nieoznakowanego. Przeprowadzane są obszerne eksperymenty na pięciu zestawach danych klasyfikacji tekstu i porównywane są kilka metod stop. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że proponowany model sprawdza się nawet lepiej niż stosowanie dodatkowego zestawu walidacji oraz istniejących metod stop, zarówno w ustawieniach danych zrównoważonych, jak i niezrównoważonych. Nasz kod jest dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ro': 'Oprirea timpurie, care este utilizată pe scară largă pentru a preveni supramontarea, se bazează, în general, pe un set separat de validare. Cu toate acestea, în setările cu resurse reduse, oprirea bazată pe validare poate fi riscantă, deoarece un set de validare mic poate să nu fie suficient de reprezentativ, iar reducerea numărului de eșantioane prin divizarea validării poate duce la eșantioane insuficiente pentru formare. În acest studiu, propunem o metodă de oprire timpurie care utilizează probe neetichetate. Metoda propusă se bazează pe similaritățile de încredere și distribuția claselor. Pentru a îmbunătăți în continuare performanța, vă prezentăm o metodă de calibrare pentru a estima mai bine distribuția de clasă a eșantioanelor neetichetate. Metoda propusă este avantajoasă deoarece nu necesită un set separat de validare și oferă un punct de oprire mai bun prin utilizarea unui set mare fără etichete. Experimente extinse sunt efectuate pe cinci seturi de date de clasificare a textelor și sunt comparate mai multe metode de stop. Rezultatele noastre arată că modelul propus performează chiar mai bine decât utilizarea unui set suplimentar de validare, precum și a metodelor de stop existente, atât în setări de date echilibrate, cât și dezechilibrate. Codul nostru este disponibil la https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'so': 'Soocista hore oo aad u isticmaali karto ka hortagga isticmaalka, waxaa lagu saleeyaa qeyb gaar ah oo shaqeynta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka loo isticmaalo habka hoose, joojinta xaqiijinta wuxuu noqon karaa khatar, sababtoo ah mid yar oo xaqiijinta looma dhigi karo mid ku filan, kamana dhimi karo tirada samooyinka lagu caddeynayo, waxay noqon kartaa samooyin ku filan waxbarashada. Waxbarashadan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab hore oo joojinta ah oo isticmaalaya samooyinka aan la shaqeynayn. Heshiiska la soo jeedo waxaa lagu saleeyaa kalsoonaanta iyo qaybinta fasalka isku mid ah. Si aan u sii kordhino samooyinka aan la sameyn karin ayaan u keenaynaa qaab xisaabinta si wanaagsan ugu qiimeynaya qaybinta fasalka. Waxaa faa’iido leh qaababka la soo jeedo, sababtoo ah uma baahnid qoraal shaqeynta oo gooni ah, wuxuuna bixiyaa goor aad u wanaagsan oo joojinta marka lagu isticmaalo saxda aan faa’iido lahayn. Shan baaritaanka qoraalka waxaa lagu sameeyaa imtixaan dheeraad ah, waxaana la barbaranayaa qaabab badan oo joojinta ah. Midhaha la soo jeedo waxay muuqataa in tilmaamaha la soo jeedo uu sameeyo mid ka wanaagsan isticmaalka saxda aqoonsiga dheeraad ah iyo sidoo kale qaababka joogista ee uu jiraa, si siman iyo siman sawirada. Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'sr': 'Rano zaustavljanje, koja se široko koristi za sprječavanje prekopterećenja, općenito se temelji na odvojenom setu potvrđenja. Međutim, u nizim nastavacima resursa, stanje na osnovu validacije može biti rizično jer mali set validacije možda nije dovoljno reprezentativan, a smanjenje broja uzorka podjelom validacije može rezultirati nedovoljnim uzorcima za obuku. U ovoj studiji predlažemo ranu metodu zaustavljanja koja koristi neopisivane uzorke. Predložena metoda je bazirana na sličnosti distribucije poverenja i klase. Da bismo dalje poboljšali provedbu, predstavljali smo metodu kalibracije kako bi bolje procenili distribuciju klase neopisivanih uzorka. Predložena metoda je prednost zato što ne zahteva određenu potvrdu za validaciju i pruža bolju tačku zaustavljanja koristeći veliku nepobeleženu setu. Eksperimenti su provedeni na pet serija podataka za klasifikaciju teksta i uspoređuju se nekoliko stopmetoda. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je predloženi model čak i bolji nego koristiti dodatne validacije postavljene kao i postojeće stopmetode, u uspravnim i ravnoteženim podacima. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'si': 'මුලින් නවත්තන්න, ඒක ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් විශේෂය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ නමුත්, අඩුම සම්බන්ධ සැකසුම් වලින්, විශ්ලේෂණය ස්ථාපනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්, මොකද පොඩි විශ්ලේෂණය සැකසුම් විදිහට ප මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඉක්මනින් නවත්තන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානය විශ්වාසය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශ විශ්වාසය සමහර විශ්වාසයේ අධාරිත වෙනවා. අපි කැලිබ්\u200dරේෂණ් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩ කරන්න, ප්\u200dරමාණ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි, මොකද ඒක වෙනස් විශේෂ විශ්වාසයක් අවශ්\u200dයයක් නැහැ ඒ වගේම ල Name අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ මොඩල් එක්ක වඩා වඩා විශේෂණයක් භාවිත කරන්න වඩා වඩා හොඳයි කියලා ප්\u200dරතිචාරය අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන් https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'sv': 'Tidigt stopp, som ofta används för att förhindra övermontering, baseras i allmänhet på en separat valideringsuppsättning. I inställningar med låga resurser kan valideringsbaserade stopp dock vara riskabelt eftersom en liten valideringsuppsättning kanske inte är tillräckligt representativ, och minskningen av antalet prover genom valideringsuppdelning kan leda till otillräckliga prover för utbildning. I denna studie föreslår vi en tidig stoppsmetod som använder omärkta prover. Den föreslagna metoden bygger på tillit och klassfördelning likheter. För att ytterligare förbättra prestandan presenterar vi en kalibreringsmetod för att bättre uppskatta klassfördelningen av de omärkta proverna. Den föreslagna metoden är fördelaktig eftersom den inte kräver en separat valideringsuppsättning och ger en bättre stoppspunkt genom att använda en stor omärkt uppsättning. Omfattande experiment utförs på fem textklassificeringsdatauppsättningar och flera stopmetoder jämförs. Våra resultat visar att den föreslagna modellen till och med presterar bättre än att använda ytterligare valideringsuppsättningar samt befintliga stop-metoder, i både balanserade och obalanserade datainställningar. Vår kod finns tillgänglig på https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ta': 'முன்னால் நிறுத்துதல், அது வெளியேறுதலை தடுக்க பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, பொதுவாக ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட செலுத்துதல் அமைப்பின ஆனால் குறைந்த மூலத்தின் அமைப்புகளில், செலுத்துதல் அடிப்படையான நிறுத்தல் ஆபத்தானதாக இருக்கும் ஏனெனில் சிறிய செலுத்தல் அமைப்பு போதுமான பிரித்தலாக இருக்கலாம இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் ஒரு ஆரம்ப நிறுத்தும் முறைமையை உபயோகிக்கும் அடையாளம் இல்லாத மாதிரிகளை பர முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமை மேலும் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டுமானால், குறிப்பிடாத மாதிரிகளின் வகுப்பு பங்கீட்டை சிறந்த மதிப்பிடுவதற முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமை பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது ஏனென்றால் அது ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட செல்லுபடியாக்குதல் அமைப்பு தேவையில்லை மற ஐந்து உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் தரவுத்தளங்களில் விரிவான சோதனைகள் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் பல நிறுத்தும் முறைகள்  நம்முடைய முடிவு எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ur': 'ابتداء قطعہ، جو اوپر فیٹ کرنے سے روکنے کے لئے وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، عموماً ایک مختلف validation set پر بنیاد ہے. However, in low resource settings, validation-based stopping can be risky because a small validation set may not be sufficiently representative, and the reduction of samples by validation split may result in insufficient samples for training. اس مطالعہ میں، ہم ایک پہلے متوقف طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو بغیر معلوم نمونے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ یقین اور کلاس تقسیم کے مثال پر بنیاد ہے. عملکرد کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک کالیبریٹ طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ بغیر معلوم نمونوں کا کلاس تقسیم کرنے کے لئے بہتر قدر کریں. پیشنهاد کا طریقہ فائدہ دیتا ہے کیونکہ اس کے لئے ایک مختلف واضح کرنی مجموعہ نہیں ہے اور ایک بڑے ناپذیر مجموعہ کے مطابق ایک بہترین منتظر پوینٹ کو پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. پینچ ٹیکسٹ کلاسپیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ پر اضافہ کی آزمائش کی جاتی ہے اور بہت سی ایستپا طریقے مقایسہ کیے جاتے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی مدل اضافہ والدیٹ کے استعمال سے بھی بہتر عمل کرتا ہے اور موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں، برالیس اور نابرالیس ڈیٹ ہمارا کوڈ اس میں موجود ہے https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'vi': 'Việc dừng chân sớm, được sử dụng rộng rãi để ngăn chặn việc tăng cường, thông thường được dựa trên một bộ hợp tra riêng. Tuy nhiên, trong các thiết lập ít tài nguyên, việc dừng dựa vào biện pháp có thể gây nguy hiểm vì một bộ ngắt dán nhỏ có thể không đủ đại diện, và việc giảm số lượng mẫu bằng cách chia miếng dán có thể gây ra không đủ mẫu để huấn luyện. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đề xuất phương pháp dừng chân sớm dùng các mẫu chưa được đóng kín. Phương pháp được đề nghị dựa trên sự tự tin và điểm phân phối xã hội. Để tăng hiệu suất hơn nữa, chúng tôi có một phương pháp cân chỉnh để ước lượng lượng phân loại các mẫu chưa được lắp. Phương pháp được đề nghị là thuận lợi bởi vì nó không cần một bộ chỉnh sửa riêng và cung cấp một điểm dừng tốt hơn bằng cách sử dụng một bộ đồ không tải lớn. Những thí nghiệm dồi dào được tiến hành trên năm bộ gia nhập mật độ văn bản và nhiều phương pháp ngăn chặn được so sánh. Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy kiểu mẫu này còn tốt hơn so với việc dùng một bộ sửa chữa bổ sung cùng với các phương pháp dừng đã có, cả trong thiết lập dữ liệu cân bằng và thiếu cân bằng. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis @ info Bu o'qituda, biz notoʻgʻri misollarni ishlatish uchun avval toʻxtatish usulini talab qilamiz. Talab qilingan usul faqat va sinfning taʼminlovchisi bir xil tilida asosida. Koʻproq bajarishni yaxshi ko'rsatish uchun biz tugmalar tarkibini yaxshi qiymatlashga ega. Name Name Bizning natijalarimizni ko'rsatadi, ilova qilingan model qoʻshimcha haqiqiqiyligini va mavjud toʻxtatish usullarini ishlatishdan ham yaxshi bajaradi. Quyidagi taʼminlovchi maʼlumot moslamalarida Kodlash usuli https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.", 'bg': 'Ранното спиране, което се използва широко за предотвратяване на претоварване, обикновено се основава на отделен набор от валидиране. Въпреки това, при условия с ниски ресурси спирането въз основа на валидиране може да бъде рисковано, тъй като малък набор от валидации може да не бъде достатъчно представителен, а намаляването на броя на пробите чрез разделяне на валидирането може да доведе до недостатъчни проби за обучение. В това проучване предлагаме метод за ранно спиране, който използва необозначени проби. Предложеният метод се основава на доверие и прилики на класово разпределение. За по-нататъшно подобряване на производителността представяме калибриращ метод за по-добра оценка на класовото разпределение на необозначените проби. Предложеният метод е изгоден, тъй като не изисква отделен набор от валидиране и осигурява по-добра точка на спиране чрез използване на голям набор без етикет. Проведени са обширни експерименти върху пет набора данни за класификация на текста и се сравняват няколко стоп-метода. Нашите резултати показват, че предложеният модел се представя дори по-добре от използването на допълнителен набор от валидиране, както и съществуващите стоп-методи, както в балансирани, така и в дисбалансирани настройки на данните. Нашият код е достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'da': 'Tidligt stop, som anvendes i vid udstrækning til at forhindre overmontering, er generelt baseret på et separat valideringssæt. I indstillinger med lave ressourcer kan valideringsbaseret standsning dog være risikabelt, fordi et lille valideringssæt måske ikke er tilstrækkeligt repræsentativt, og reduktionen af antallet af prøver ved valideringsopdeling kan resultere i utilstrækkelige prøver til træning. I denne undersøgelse foreslår vi en tidlig stopningsmetode, der anvender ikke-mærkede prøver. Den foreslåede metode er baseret på tillid og klassefordelingsligheder. For yderligere at forbedre ydeevnen præsenterer vi en kalibreringsmetode til bedre at estimere klassefordelingen af de ikke-mærkede prøver. Den foreslåede metode er fordelagtig, fordi den ikke kræver et separat valideringssæt og giver et bedre stoppunkt ved at bruge et stort mærket sæt. Der udføres omfattende eksperimenter på fem tekstklassifikationsdatasæt, og flere stop-metoder sammenlignes. Vores resultater viser, at den foreslåede model endda klarer sig bedre end at bruge et ekstra valideringssæt samt de eksisterende stop-metoder, både i balancerede og ubalancerede dataindstillinger. Vores kode er tilgængelig på https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'de': 'Frühzeitiges Stoppen, das häufig verwendet wird, um Überfitting zu verhindern, basiert in der Regel auf einem separaten Validierungsset. In Umgebungen mit geringen Ressourcen kann ein validierungsbasiertes Stoppen jedoch riskant sein, da ein kleiner Validierungssatz möglicherweise nicht ausreichend repräsentativ ist und die Verringerung der Anzahl der Proben durch Validierungssplittung zu unzureichenden Proben für Schulungen führen kann. In dieser Studie schlagen wir eine frühe Stoppmethode vor, die unbekennzeichnete Proben verwendet. Die vorgeschlagene Methode basiert auf Vertrauensverhältnissen und Ähnlichkeiten der Klassenverteilung. Um die Leistung weiter zu verbessern, stellen wir eine Kalibriermethode vor, mit der die Klassenverteilung der nicht beschrifteten Proben besser abgeschätzt werden kann. Die vorgeschlagene Methode ist vorteilhaft, da sie keinen separaten Validierungssatz erfordert und einen besseren Anhaltspunkt durch die Verwendung eines großen, nicht beschrifteten Satzes bietet. Umfangreiche Experimente werden an fünf Textklassifikationsdatensätzen durchgeführt und mehrere Stop-Methoden miteinander verglichen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell sogar besser abschneidet als die Verwendung eines zusätzlichen Validierungssatzes sowie der vorhandenen Stop-Methoden, sowohl in symmetrischen als auch in unausgewogenen Dateneinstellungen. Unser Code ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ko': '조기 정지는 통상적으로 단독 검증 집합을 바탕으로 과도한 의합을 방지하는 데 널리 쓰인다.그러나 자원이 비교적 적은 환경에서 검증을 바탕으로 하는 정지는 위험이 있을 수 있다. 작은 검증 집합이 충분한 대표성을 가지지 못할 수도 있고 검증을 통해 샘플의 수량을 줄이면 교육에 사용할 샘플이 부족할 수 있기 때문이다.이 연구에서 우리는 미표기 견본을 사용하는 조기 정지 방법을 제시했다.이 방법은 신뢰도와 분류 분포의 유사성에 기초를 두고 있다.성능을 한층 높이기 위해 우리는 표기되지 않은 견본의 분류 분포를 더욱 잘 예측하기 위해 교정 방법을 제시했다.제시된 방법은 단독 검증 집합이 필요하지 않고 대형 미표시 집합을 사용하여 더 좋은 정지점을 제공하기 때문에 유리하다.다섯 개의 텍스트 분류 데이터 집합에서 대량의 실험을 하고 몇 가지 정지 방법을 비교했다.우리의 결과에 따르면 균형과 비균형 데이터 설정에서 이 모델은 추가 검증 집합과 기존의 정지 방법보다 훨씬 낫다.우리 코드는https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'hr': 'Rani prestanak, koji se široko koristi za sprječavanje prekopterećenja, općenito se temelji na odvojenom setu potvrđenja. Međutim, u području niskih resursa, zaustavljanje na temelju validacije može biti rizično jer mali komplet validacije ne može biti dovoljno reprezentativan, a smanjenje broja uzorka podjelom validacije može rezultirati nedovoljnim uzorcima za obuku. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo preranu metodu zaustavljanja koja koristi nezabelovane uzorke. Predložena metoda se temelji na sličnosti distribucije poverenja i klase. Da bismo dalje poboljšali učinkovitost, predstavili smo metodu kalibracije kako bi bolje procijenili raspodjelu klase nezabeliranih uzorka. Predložena metoda je prednost jer ne zahtijeva određenu potvrdu i pruža bolju staničnu točku koristeći veliku nezabeliranu setu. Prošireni eksperimenti se provode na pet podataka klasifikacije teksta i uspoređuju se nekoliko stopmetoda. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je predloženi model čak i bolji nego koristiti dodatne validacije postavljene kao i postojeće stopmetode, u uspravnim i ravnoteženim podacima. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'nl': 'Vroegtijdig stoppen, wat veel wordt gebruikt om overfitting te voorkomen, is over het algemeen gebaseerd op een aparte validatieset. Bij instellingen met weinig resources kan het stoppen op validatie echter riskant zijn omdat een kleine validatieset mogelijk niet voldoende representatief is en de vermindering van het aantal monsters door validatiesplitsing kan leiden tot onvoldoende monsters voor training. In deze studie stellen we een vroege stop methode voor die gebruik maakt van niet-gelabelde monsters. De voorgestelde methode is gebaseerd op zelfvertrouwen en klasseverdeling overeenkomsten. Om de prestaties verder te verbeteren, presenteren we een kalibratiemethode om de klasseverdeling van de niet-gelabelde monsters beter in te schatten. De voorgestelde methode is voordelig omdat het geen aparte validatieset vereist en een beter stoppunt biedt door gebruik te maken van een grote set zonder label. Uitgebreide experimenten worden uitgevoerd op vijf tekstclassificatiedatasets en verschillende stop-methoden worden vergeleken. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde model zelfs beter presteert dan het gebruik van een extra validatieset en de bestaande stop-methoden, zowel in gebalanceerde als onbalans data instellingen. Onze code is beschikbaar op https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'id': 'Hentikan awal, yang sering digunakan untuk mencegah overfitting, secara umum berdasarkan set validasi terpisah. Namun, dalam pengaturan sumber daya rendah, penghentian berdasarkan validasi dapat berbahaya karena set validasi kecil mungkin tidak cukup mewakili, dan pengurangan jumlah sampel dengan pembagian validasi mungkin menyebabkan sampel yang tidak cukup untuk latihan. Dalam penelitian ini, kami mengusulkan metode penghentian awal yang menggunakan sampel tanpa label. Metode yang diusulkan berdasarkan kepercayaan dan perbedaan distribusi kelas. Untuk meningkatkan prestasinya lebih lanjut, kami mempersembahkan metode kalibrasi untuk memperkirakan lebih baik distribusi kelas sampel yang tidak berlebihan. Metode yang diusulkan adalah keuntungan karena tidak membutuhkan set validasi terpisah dan menyediakan titik berhenti yang lebih baik dengan menggunakan set besar tanpa label. Eksperimen ekstensif dilakukan pada lima set data klasifikasi teks dan beberapa metode berhenti dibandingkan. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan bahkan berhasil lebih baik daripada menggunakan set validasi tambahan serta metode berhenti yang ada, dalam pengaturan data yang seimbang dan tidak seimbang. Kode kita tersedia di https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'sw': 'Kusimama kwa mara ya kwanza, ambacho kinatumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa ili kuzuia kupatikana, kwa ujumla ni kwa kutumia seti ya uthibitisho tofauti. However, in low resource settings, validation-based stopping can be risky because a small validation set may not be sufficiently representative, and the reduction in the number of samples by validation split may result in insufficient samples for training.  Katika utafiti huu, tunapendekeza njia ya kusimama mapema ambayo hutumia sampuli zisizo sahihi. Utawala huu unapendekezwa unategemea imani na usambazaji wa darasa sawa. Ili kuendeleza ufanisi huo zaidi, tunaweka mbinu ya ukarabati ili kadiria usambazaji wa darasa uliofanywa na sampuli zisizoeleweka. Utawala huu unapendekezwa ni faida kwa sababu haihitaji seti ya uthibitisho tofauti na kutoa pointi bora ya kusimama kwa kutumia seti kubwa isiyoeleweka. Majaribio mengi yanafanywa katika seti za taarifa za usambazaji wa maandishi matano na njia kadhaa za kusitisha zinalinganishwa. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa modeli ya pendekezo hata inafanya vizuri zaidi ya kutumia seti ya uhakikishaji wa ziada pamoja na njia za kusimama zilizopo, katika mazingira ya data yenye usawa na usawa. Utawala wetu unapatikana katika https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'sq': 'Early stopping, which is widely used to prevent overfitting, is generally based on a separate validation set.  Megjithatë, në rregullimet e ulëta të burimeve, ndalimi bazuar në vlerësim mund të jetë i rrezikshëm sepse një grup i vogël i vlerësimit mund të mos jetë përfaqësues i mjaftueshëm dhe zvogëlimi i numrit të mostrave nga ndarja e vlerësimit mund të rezultojë në mostra të pamjaftueshme për trajnimin. Në këtë studim, ne propozojmë një metodë ndalimi të hershëm që përdor mostra të pa-shënuara. Metoda e propozuar bazohet në besimin dhe ngjashmërinë e shpërndarjes së klasave. Për të përmirësuar më tej paraqitjen, ne paraqesim një metodë kalibrimi për të vlerësuar më mirë shpërndarjen e klasës të mostërave të pa etiketë. Metoda e propozuar është e dobishme sepse nuk kërkon një set të veçantë vlerësimi dhe ofron një pikë ndalimi më të mirë duke përdorur një set të madh pa etiketë. Eksperimente të gjera kryehen në pesë grupe të dhënash klasifikuese teksti dhe krahasohen disa metoda ndalimi. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se modeli i propozuar funksionon edhe më mirë se sa përdorimi i një kompleti të vlerësimit shtesë si dhe metodat ekzistuese të ndalimit, si në rregullime të të dhënave të ekuilibruara ashtu edhe të paekuilibruara. Kodi ynë është në dispozicion në https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'tr': 'Irki durum, iň ýaramazlygy önlemek üçin ullanýar, adatça ayrı taýýarlama düzeninde daýrylýar. Ýöne, iň az resurs düzümlerinde, taýýarlama tabanly basmalar riskli bolup biler, sebäbi kiçi taýýarlama düzümleri ýeterlik şekilde reprezental däl, we ýazmak üçin nusgalaryň azalyşygy ahyrlamak üçin ýeterlik nusgalar bolup biler. Bu öwrenmede, biz ýazylmaz nusgalary ulanan irräk durum yöntemi teklip edýäris. Mazmunlar üçin gurnalýan yöntem ynamly we klas daýratynyň meňzeşliklerine daýanýar. Çarpmylygy täzeleştirmek üçin, biz kalibrasyon yöntemi başarmak üçin klas daýlamagyny gowurak hasaplamak üçin tanyşdyrýarys. Görkezilen metin adatça bolmaly sebäbi ol ayrı bir taýýarlama düzümleri gerek däl we uly sözlemeýän bir düzümleri ulanarak gowy bir duramak noktasyny temin edýär. 5 metin klasifikasyon datasynda we birnäçe halt-yöntemleri çykarylýar. Biziň netijelerimiz teklip eden nusganyň hatda esasy taýýarlama çykyşlygyny we bar durum çykyşlygyny hem çykyş we çykyş hasaplanjak düzümlerinde has gowydygyny görkezýär. Biziň kodymyz bar https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'fa': 'اولین جلوگیری که برای جلوگیری از زیادی قابل تعیین استفاده می\u200cشود، عموما بر مجموعه تأیید جدا بنیاد می\u200cگیرد. ولی در تنظیمات منابع پایین، وابسته\u200cای بر اساس تایید\u200cکردن می\u200cتواند خطرناک باشد، زیرا یک مجموعه تایید\u200cکردن کوچک ممکن است به اندازه کافی نمایش\u200cدهنده نباشد، و کاهش تعداد نمونه\u200cهای با تقسیم تایید\u200cکردن ممکن است نمونه\u200cهای کافی برای آموزش به نتی در این مطالعه، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش جلوگیری که از نمونه\u200cهای نامزدی استفاده می\u200cکند. این روش پیشنهاد بر اساس شبیه\u200cهای اعتماد و تقسیم کلاس است. برای پیشرفت عملکرد بیشتر، ما یک روش kaliبریزی را برای بهتر تقسیم تقسیم کلاس نمونه\u200cهای غیرقابل نوشته می\u200cکنیم. این روش پیشنهاد مفید است چون نیاز به مجموعه تأیید جدا نیست و با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cی بزرگ نامه\u200cگذاری بهتر یک نقطه متوقف می\u200cکند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده روی پنج تنظیم داده\u200cهای تنظیم متن انجام می\u200cشود و چند روش\u200cهای متوقف مقایسه می\u200cشوند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد حتی بهتر از استفاده از یک تأیید اضافه\u200cای و روش\u200cهای متوقف موجود، در تنظیمات داده\u200cهای مقایسه و نابرابری انجام می\u200cدهد. کد ما در دسترس است https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'af': "Vroeg stop, wat heeltemal gebruik word om oorvloediging te voorkom, is algemeen gebaseer op 'n aparte geldigheidstel. Maar in lae hulpbron-instellings kan die geldigheidgebaseerde stopping risiko wees omdat 'n klein geldigheidstel dalk nie genoeg voorstel is nie, en die reduksie in die nommer van voorbeelde deur geldigheidgebaseerde deel kan resultaat in ongelukkige voorbeelde vir opvoering. In hierdie studie, voorstel ons 'n vroeg stop metode wat ongeabelde voorbeelde gebruik. Die voorgestelde metode is gebaseer op vertroue en klas verspreiding gelykenisse. Om die prestasie verder te verbeter, laat ons 'n kalibreringmetode voorsien om die klas verspreiding van die ongeabelde voorbeelde beter te vurdering. Die voorgestelde metode is voordeel omdat dit nie 'n aparte geldigheidstel nodig nie en verskaf 'n beter stop punt deur 'n groot ongeabelde stel te gebruik nie. Name Ons resultate wys dat die voorgestelde model selfs beter uitvoer as 'n addisionele geldigheidstelling en die bestaande stop-metodes, in beide balanseerde en onbalanseerde data instellings. Ons kode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.", 'hy': 'Առաջին կանգ առնելը, որը լայնորեն օգտագործվում է չափազանց լայն տեղադրման կանխման համար, սովորաբար հիմնված է առանձին հավասարման համակարգի վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, ցածր ռեսուրսների միջոցներում կարելի է վտանգավոր դադարեցնել, քանի որ փոքրիկ հավասարման համակարգը կարող է բավարար ներկայացուցիչ չլինել, և նմուշների թիվը հավասարման բաժանման միջոցով կրճատման արդյունքում կարող է հանգեցնել ուսուցման համար Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք վաղ կանգ առնելու մեթոդ, որը օգտագործում է աննշաններ: Պատրաստված մեթոդը հիմնված է վստահության և դասարանի տարածման նմանությունների վրա: Ավելի բարելավելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք կալիբրացիայի մեթոդ, որպեսզի ավելի լավ գնահատենք աննշված նմուշների դասարանի բաշխման մասին: Պատրաստված մեթոդը առավելություն ունի, որովհետև այն անհրաժեշտ չէ առանձին հավասարման համակարգ, և ավելի լավ կանգ է տալիս օգտագործելով մեծ անվավեր համակարգ: Հինգ տեքստի դասակարգման տվյալների համակարգերի վրա մեծ փորձեր են կատարվում, և համեմատում են մի քանի կանգ-մեթոդներ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նախագծված մոդելը նույնիսկ ավելի լավ է աշխատում, քան օգտագործելով ավելացյալ հավասարման համակարգ, ինչպես նաև գոյություն ունեցող կանգ-մեթոդներ, ինչպես էլ հավասարակշռություն և անհավասար տվ Մեր կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'am': 'የቀድሞ መቆም፣ በተስፋት ለመከለከል የሚጠቀሙት፣ በተለየ ዶሴ ማረጋገጫ የተደረገ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በጥቂት resource settings፣ የሚያረጋግጥ ማሰናከል ይችላል፤ ትንሽ የእውነትን ማረጋገጫ ማሰናከል አይበቃምና፤ በጥያቄው ቍጥር የሚያጎድለውን ምሳሌዎች ለማስተማር አይበቃቸውም፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ ያልተጻፈ ምሳሌዎችን የሚጠቀም የቀድሞ መቆም ማድረግ እናስባለን፡፡ በተገኘው ሥርዓት መፍትና የክፍል ትክክል በሚመስል ላይ ነው፡፡ ጥያቄውን ለማሻል፣ የክሊምፕዩተርን ክፍተት ለመሻል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የተጠቃሚ ነው ምክንያቱም የተለየ የአሁኑን ማረጋገጫ አያስፈልግምና በተለየ ትልቅ ያልታወቀ ስርዓት በመጠቀም የተሻለ የመቆም ነጥብ ይሰጠዋል፡፡ በአምስት የጽሑፍ ክፍተቶችን መክፈቻ ላይ ተጨማሪ ፈተናዎች ይደረጋሉ እና ብዙ ቆዳ-methods ይተካከላሉ። ፍሬዎቻችን በተዘጋጀ እና በተመሳሳይ እና በተመለከተ የዳታ ማዘጋጀት ላይ የሚሻል ምሳሌ ይሠራል፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'az': 'Əvvəlki durum, çox yüksək fitnəyə qadağan etmək üçün istifadə edilən, genellikle ayrı təsdiqləmə quruluğuna dayanılır. Lakin, düşük ressurs ayarlarında, təsdiqləmə dayandırılması riskli olar, çünki kiçik təsdiqləmə qurğusu kifayət qədər təsdiqləməyə layiq olmayabilir, və nümunələrin sayını təsdiqləməsi ilə dəyişdirilməsi üçün kifayət nümunələr olar. Bu təhsil içində, əvvəlcə mövzusuz nümunələri istifadə edən ilk durma metodu təklif edirik. Bu təklif metodu güvenilir və sınıf dağıtımın bənzərinə dayanılır. Əlavəti daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün, müəyyən edilməmiş nümunələrin sınıf dağıtımını daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün kalibrasyon yolunu göstəririk. Bu təklif metodu faydalıdır, çünki o, ayrı təsdiqləmə qurğusu istəmirdi və böyük təklif edilməmiş qurğunu istifadə edərək daha yaxşı durma nöqtəsini təmin edir. Beş metin klasifikasiya veri qurularında genişləndirilən təcrübələr və bir çox durma metodları salındırılır. Bizim sonuçlarımız göstərilir ki, təklif edilmiş modellərin hətta daha yaxşısını, həmçin in mövcud duran metodların, həmçinin balançılıq və müəyyən edilmiş veri ayarlarında istifadə etməkdən daha yaxşısını etmişdir. Bizim kodumuz https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'bs': 'Rano zaustavljanje, koja se široko koristi za sprječavanje preuređenja, općenito se temelji na odvojenom setu potvrđenja. Međutim, u nizim nastavacima resursa, zaustavljanje na temelju validacije može biti rizično jer mali set validacije možda nije dovoljno reprezentativan, a smanjenje broja uzorka podjelom validacije može rezultirati nedovoljnim uzorcima za obuku. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo ranu metodu zaustavljanja koja koristi nezabelovane uzorke. Predložena metoda se temelji na sličnosti distribucije poverenja i klase. Da bismo dalje poboljšali učinkovitost, predstavili smo metodu kalibracije kako bi bolje procijenili distribuciju klase neopisivanih uzorka. Predložena metoda je prednost jer ne zahtijeva određenu potvrdu i pruža bolju tačku zaustavljanja koristeći veliku nezabelovanu setu. Eksperimenti se provode na pet podataka klasifikacije teksta i uspoređuju se nekoliko stopmetoda. Naši rezultati pokazuju da je predloženi model čak i bolji nego koristiti dodatne validacije postavljene kao i postojeće stopmetode, u uspravnim i ravnoteženim podacima. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'bn': 'প্রথম থামানোর জন্য, যা ব্যাপকভাবে প্রবাহিত করার জন্য ব্যবহৃত, সাধারণত একটি বৈধ বৈধ সেটের উপর ভিত্তিক। তবে কম সম্পদের বৈশিষ্ট্যে বৈধতা ভিত্তিক থামাতে পারে কারণ একটি ছোট বৈধতা সেট সম্ভবত যথেষ্ট প্রতিনিধিত্ব না এবং বৈধতার সংখ্যা কমানো সম্ভবত প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য যথেষ্ট ন এই গবেষণায় আমরা একটি প্রাথমিক থামানো পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যা অলাইন টামপাল ব্যবহার করে। প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি একই ধরনের বিতরণ এবং ক্লাস বিতরণের উপর ভিত্তিক। আরো ভালো করার জন্য আমরা একটি ক্যালিবেশন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যাতে ক্লাস বিতরণের ভালোভাবে হিসেব করা যায়। প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সুবিধাজনক কারণ এটি একটি বিভিন্ন বৈধ সেটের প্রয়োজন নেই এবং একটি বিশাল বৈধ সেট ব্যবহার করে ব্যবহার করে একটি বিশাল বৈ Extensive experiments are conducted on five text classification datasets and several stop-methods are compared.  আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের চেয়েও ভালো কাজ করে যাচ্ছে একটি বৈধ বৈধ ব্যবস্থা ব্যবহার করার চেয়ে এবং বিদ্যমান থামানো পদ্ধত আমাদের কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ca': "L'atur precoce, que s'utilitza ampliament per prevenir la sobreemportació, es basa generalment en un conjunt de validació separat. No obstant això, en condicions de baix recursos, la detenció basada en la validació pot ser arriscada perquè un petit conjunt de validació pot no ser suficientment representatiu, i la reducció del nombre de mostres per divisió de validació pot resultar en mostres insuficients per a formar-se. En aquest estudi, proposem un mètode de parada temprana que utilitza mostres sense etiqueta. El mètode proposat es basa en la confiança i les similituds de distribució de classe. Per millorar més el rendiment, presentem un mètode de calibració per estimar millor la distribució de classe de les mostres sense etiqueta. El mètode proposat és avantatge perquè no necessita un conjunt de validació separat i proporciona un punt de parada millor utilitzant un conjunt gran sense etiqueta. Es fan extensos experiments en cinc conjunts de dades de classificació de textos i es comparen diversos mètodes de parada. Our results show that the proposed model even performs better than using an additional validation set as well as the existing stop-methods, in both balanced and imbalanced data settings.  El nostre codi està disponible en https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.", 'cs': 'Včasné zastavení, které se široce používá k prevenci nadměrného vybavení, je obecně založeno na samostatném ověřovacím sadě. Při nastavení s nízkými zdroji však může být zastavení založené na validaci riskantní, protože malá sada validací nemusí být dostatečně reprezentativní a snížení počtu vzorků rozdělením validace může vést k nedostatku vzorků pro výcvik. V této studii navrhujeme metodu včasného zastavení, která používá neoznačené vzorky. Navržená metoda je založena na důvěře a podobnostech distribuce tříd. Pro další zlepšení výkonu představujeme kalibrační metodu pro lepší odhad třídního rozložení neoznačených vzorků. Navrhovaná metoda je výhodná, protože nevyžaduje samostatnou sadu ověřování a poskytuje lepší bod zastavení pomocí velké sady bez označení. Na pěti textových klasifikačních datových sadách jsou provedeny rozsáhlé experimenty a porovnány je několik stop-metod. Naše výsledky ukazují, že navržený model dokonce funguje lépe než použití další validační sady a stávajících stop-metod, a to jak v vyváženém, tak i nevyváženém nastavení dat. Náš kód je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'et': 'Varajane peatamine, mida kasutatakse laialdaselt ülepaigutamise vältimiseks, põhineb üldjuhul eraldi valideerimiskomplektil. Väheste ressursside korral võib valideerimisel põhinev peatamine siiski olla riskantne, sest väike valideerimiskogum ei pruugi olla piisavalt esinduslik ning valideerimise jagamise tulemusena võib valideerimise tulemuseks olla ebapiisav valim koolituseks. Selles uuringus pakume välja varajase peatamise meetodi, mis kasutab märgistamata proove. Kavandatud meetod põhineb usaldusväärsusel ja klassijaotuse sarnasustel. Tõhususe edasiseks parandamiseks esitame kalibreerimismeetodi märgistamata proovide klassijaotuse paremaks hindamiseks. Kavandatud meetod on kasulik, sest see ei nõua eraldi valideerimiskomplekti ning pakub suure märgistamata komplekti kasutamisel paremat peatumispunkti. Põhjalikud katsed viiakse läbi viies tekstiklassifikatsiooni andmekogumis ja võrreldakse mitmeid stop-meetodeid. Meie tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud mudel toimib paremini kui täiendava valideerimiskomplekti ja olemasolevate stop-meetodite kasutamine nii tasakaalustatud kui tasakaalustatud andmeseadmetes. Meie kood on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'fi': 'Varhainen pysäytys, jota käytetään laajalti ylikuormituksen estämiseen, perustuu yleensä erilliseen validointijoukkoon. Vähäisissä resursseissa validointiin perustuva lopettaminen voi kuitenkin olla riskialtista, koska pieni validointijoukko ei välttämättä ole riittävän edustava ja näytteen määrän väheneminen validoinnin jakamalla voi johtaa riittämättömiin näytteisiin koulutusta varten. Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotamme varhaisen pysähdyksen menetelmää, jossa käytetään merkitsemättömiä näytteitä. Ehdotettu menetelmä perustuu luottamus- ja luokkajakauman samankaltaisuuksiin. Suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi esittelemme kalibrointimenetelmän merkitsemättömien näytteiden luokkajakauman arvioimiseksi. Ehdotettu menetelmä on hyödyllinen, koska se ei vaadi erillistä validointisarjaa ja tarjoaa paremman pysäytyspisteen käyttämällä suurta merkitsemätöntä joukkoa. Kattavia kokeiluja tehdään viidellä tekstiluokitteluaineistolla ja vertaillaan useita stop-menetelmiä. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli suoriutuu jopa paremmin kuin lisävalidointisarjan ja olemassa olevien stop-menetelmien käyttö sekä tasapainoisissa että epätasapainoisissa dataasetuksissa. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'sk': 'Zgodnja ustavitev, ki se pogosto uporablja za preprečevanje prekomernega nameščanja, običajno temelji na ločenem naboru potrjevanja. Vendar pa je lahko v okoljih z nizkimi viri ustavitev, ki temelji na validaciji, tvegano, ker majhen nabor validacij morda ni dovolj reprezentativen, zmanjšanje števila vzorcev z razdelitvijo validacije pa lahko povzroči nezadostne vzorce za usposabljanje. V tej študiji predlagamo metodo zgodnje ustavitve, ki uporablja neoznačene vzorce. Predlagana metoda temelji na podobnostih zaupanja in porazdelitve razredov. Za nadaljnje izboljšanje učinkovitosti smo predstavili kalibracijsko metodo za boljšo oceno razredne porazdelitve neoznačenih vzorcev. Predlagana metoda je koristna, ker ne zahteva ločenega nabora validacij in zagotavlja boljšo točko ustavitve z uporabo velikega nabora brez oznake. Izvedeni so obsežni poskusi na petih naborih podatkov o klasifikaciji besedila in primerjamo več stop-metod. Naši rezultati kažejo, da je predlagani model celo boljši od uporabe dodatnega nabora validacij in obstoječih stop-metod, tako v uravnoteženih kot neravnoteženih podatkovnih nastavitvah. Naša koda je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'he': 'Early stopping, which is widely used to prevent overfitting, is generally based on a separate validation set.  עם זאת, במסדרות משאבים נמוכות, עצור מבוסס באישור יכול להיות מסוכן כי קבוצת האישור הקטנה עשויה לא להיות מייצגית מספיק, והפחית במספר הדגימות על ידי פיצוי האישור עשויה להוביל בדגימות לא מספיקות לאימון. במחקר הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת עצרה מוקדמת שמשתמשת בדגימות ללא סימנים. השיטה המוצעת מבוססת על ביטחון והדמיוניות של פיצול כיתה. כדי לשפר את ההופעה נוספת, אנחנו מציגים שיטת קליבריה כדי להעריך טוב יותר את ההפצה בכיתה של הדגימות הלא מודפסות. השיטה המוצעת מועילה כי היא לא דורשת קבוצת אישור נפרדת ומספקת נקודת עצרה טובה יותר על ידי השימוש בסט גדול ללא סימנים. ניסויים רחבים נעשים על חמישה קבוצות מידע מסווג טקסט וכמה שיטות עצור משוואות. התוצאות שלנו מראות שהמודל המוצע אפילו עובד טוב יותר מאשר להשתמש בסט אישור נוסף, כמו גם בשיטות הפסקה קיימות, גם במסגרות נתונים מאוזנות וגם לא מאוזנות. הקוד שלנו זמין ב https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'jv': 'Wis politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo mrêmêr kuwi tanggal nggawe balêr. Perintah sing dipunangguna kuwi wis dipunangguna karo kipar-kipar ntasun kuwi. Jejaring Perintah sing dipunangke dipunangke sing apik saiki, dadi ora nyasaanku akeh gunakake dadi apik batar nggawe aturan sing luwih apik tur angel. section Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngomong nik nggawe model sing luwih apik, dadi ngubah perusahaan mulasar tentang ngono nggawe sistem sing beraksi dadi bisa balan lan basa data sing beraksi. Awake kode sing dibutuhke ing https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.', 'ha': "@ action: button However, in low resource settings, validation-based stopping can be risky because a small validation set may not be sufficiently representative, and the reduction in the number of samples by validation split may result in insufficient samples for training.  A cikin wannan littafi, Munã buɗa wata metode ta tsaya gaba ɗaya, wanda ke amfani da misãlai da ba'a yi ba da amfani ba. @ info: whatsthis To, dõmin ya ƙara game da aikin ƙwarai, za mu ƙayyade wata hanyoyi wa kalibori dõmin ka ƙaddara rabin darafõfi na da ba'a aikata ba. @ info: whatsthis An tafiyar da jarrabai masu yawa kan daidaita data masu classified na matsayi, kuma a sami wasu shiryoyin-tsayi. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa, misalin da aka buƙata shi yana mafiya alhẽri ko ya yi amfani da shirin tsari mai ƙaranci da kuma da metoden-tsayi da ke jira, cikin daidaita da kuma ba da balanci ba. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.", 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛུགས་མཚམས་འཇོག་བཞིན་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཆེན་རྒོལ་འགོག་ཐབས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཁུངས་ཆུང་བའི་སྒྲིག ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་པར་དབྱིབས་མེད་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྒོ་རྒྱག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བསམ གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ཡིད་རྟོན་དང་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་བགོ་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྟེན་འདུག གྲངས་འབོར་ཚད་གཞན་དང་མཐོང་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྟར་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་མིན་དབྱེ་བ་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིམ དམིགས རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལྔའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྲོད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས། མ་ཆད་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ཚོ་ Our results show that the proposed model even performs better than using an additional validation set as well as the existing stop-methods, in both balanced and imbalanced data settings. ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/BUS-stop.'}
{'en': 'Right for the Right Reason Evidence Extraction for Trustworthy Tabular Reasoning', 'fr': 'Meta-learning via le réglage contextuel du modèle de langage', 'es': 'Meta-aprendizaje a través del ajuste en contexto del modelo de lenguaje', 'ar': 'ميتا التعلم عبر نموذج اللغة الضبط في السياق', 'pt': 'Metaaprendizagem por meio do ajuste no contexto do modelo de linguagem', 'ja': '言語モデルインコンテキストチューニングによるメタラーニング', 'zh': '以语言模元学上下文调优', 'hi': 'मेटा-भाषा मॉडल इन-कॉन्टेक्स्ट ट्यूनिंग के माध्यम से सीखना', 'ru': 'Мета-обучение через настройку языковой модели в контексте', 'ga': 'Meta-fhoghlaim trí Mhúnla Teanga Tiúnadh i gComhthéacs', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μεταμάθηση μέσω Γλωσσικού Μοντέλου Συντονισμός στο πλαίσιο', 'hu': 'Meta-tanulás nyelvi modell segítségével In-context Tuning', 'it': 'Meta-apprendimento tramite il modello linguistico In-context Tuning', 'kk': 'Тіл үлгісін баптау арқылы мета оқыту', 'lt': 'Meta-learning via Language Model In-context Tuning', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ മോഡലിലൂടെ മെറ്റാ പഠിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Pelajaran-meta melalui Model Bahasa Penyesuaian Dalam Konteks', 'mn': 'Холбоо загвараар мета суралцах', 'mt': 'Meta-tagħlim permezz tal-Mudell tal-Lingwi Tuning fil-kuntest', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Meta-learning za pomocą modelu językowego Dostrojenie w kontekście', 'ro': 'Meta-învățare prin intermediul modelului lingvistic În context Tuning', 'sr': 'Metanaučenje putem jezičkog modela u kontekstu', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Waxbarashada Meta via Model in-context Tuning', 'sv': 'Metainlärning via språkmodell In-context Tuning', 'ta': 'மொழி மாதிரி மூலம் மெடா கற்றுக்கொள்ள முடிவு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Siêu học qua mô hình ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ cảnh', 'bg': 'Метаобучение чрез езиков модел', 'de': 'Meta-Learning mittels Sprachmodell In-context Tuning', 'hr': 'Metaučenje putem jezičkog modela u kontekstu', 'nl': 'Meta-learning via Taalmodel In-context Tuning', 'da': 'Metalæring via sprogmodel In-context Tuning', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa Meta kupitia Modeli ya Lugha In-context Tuning', 'id': 'Metabelajar melalui Model Bahasa Penyesuaian Dalam Konteks', 'ko': '언어 환경 조정 중 언어 모델에 기초한 원 학습', 'sq': 'Metamësimi nëpërmjet modelit gjuhësor', 'tr': 'Dil nusgasy görä Meta öwrenmek', 'hy': 'Մետասովորելը լեզվի մոդելի միջոցով', 'am': 'In-context Tuning', 'az': 'Dil Modeli il톛 Meta 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'ভাষা মোডেলের মাধ্যমে মেটা শিক্ষার্থী', 'bs': 'Metaučenje kroz jezički model u kontekstu', 'cs': 'Meta-learning prostřednictvím jazykového modelu V kontextu ladění', 'et': 'Metaõppimine keelemudeli kaudu Kontekstisisene häälestamine', 'ca': 'Meta-learning via Language Model In-context Tuning', 'fi': 'Meta-oppiminen kielimallin avulla In-context Tuning', 'af': 'Name', 'sk': 'Metaučenje prek jezikovnega modela v kontekstu', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'text-tool-action', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་མ་དབྱིབས་ནང་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་དབྱེ་བ'}
{'en': 'When pre trained contextualized embedding based models developed for unstructured data are adapted for structured tabular data they perform admirably However recent probing studies show that these models use spurious correlations and often predict inference labels by focusing on false evidence or ignoring it altogether To study this issue we introduce the task of Trustworthy Tabular Reasoning where a model needs to extract evidence to be used for reasoning in addition to predicting the label As a case study we propose a two stage sequential prediction approach which includes an evidence extraction and an inference stage First we crowdsource evidence row labels and develop several unsupervised and supervised evidence extraction strategies for InfoTabS a tabular NLI benchmark Our evidence extraction strategy outperforms earlier baselines On the downstream tabular inference task using only the automatically extracted evidence as the premise our approach outperforms prior benchmarks', 'ar': 'الهدف من التعلم التلوي هو تعلم كيفية التكيف مع مهمة جديدة من خلال عدد قليل من الأمثلة المصنفة. مستوحى من التقدم الأخير في نماذج اللغات الكبيرة ، نقترح $ \\ textit {in-Context tuning} $ (ICT) ، والذي يعيد صياغة تكيف المهمة والتنبؤ كمشكلة توقع تسلسل بسيط: لتشكيل تسلسل الإدخال ، نقوم بتوصيل تعليمات المهمة ، والمسمى أمثلة في السياق ، والمدخلات المستهدفة للتنبؤ ؛ للتدريب التلوي للنموذج للتعلم من الأمثلة الموجودة في السياق ، نقوم بضبط نموذج اللغة المدربين مسبقًا (LM) للتنبؤ بالتسمية المستهدفة بالنظر إلى تسلسل الإدخال في مجموعة من المهام.\nنحن نقيس طريقتنا على مجموعتين من مهام تصنيف النص: LAMA و BinaryClfs. مقارنةً بـ MAML الذي يتكيف مع النموذج من خلال النسب المتدرج ، فإن طريقتنا تستفيد من التحيز الاستقرائي لـ LMs المدربة مسبقًا لأداء مطابقة النمط ، وتتفوق على MAML بمتوسط درجات AUC-ROC المطلقة $ 6 \\٪ $ على BinaryClfs ، واكتساب المزيد من المزايا مع زيادة حجم النموذج. مقارنة بالتعلم غير المضبوط في السياق (أي دفع LM الخام) ، فإن الضبط التلوي في السياق يدرّب النموذج للتعلم من أمثلة السياق. في BinaryClfs ، تعمل تكنولوجيا المعلومات والاتصالات على تحسين متوسط درجات AUC-ROC بمقدار $ 10 \\٪ $ مطلقًا ، وتقليل التباين بسبب الطلب على سبيل المثال بمقدار 6x واختيارات المثال بمقدار 2x.', 'es': 'El objetivo del meta-aprendizaje es aprender a adaptarse a una nueva tarea con solo unos pocos ejemplos etiquetados. Inspirados por el progreso reciente en modelos de lenguaje grandes, proponemos $\\ textit {ajuste en contexto} $ (ICT), que replantea la adaptación y predicción de tareas como un simple problema de predicción de secuencia: para formar la secuencia de entrada, concatenamos la instrucción de la tarea, etiquetada como ejemplos en contexto y la entrada objetivo para predecir; para metaentrenar el modelo para que aprenda de ejemplos en contexto, ajustamos un modelo de lenguaje (LM) previamente entrenado para predecir la etiqueta objetivo dada la secuencia de entrada en una colección de tareas.\nComparamos nuestro método en dos conjuntos de tareas de clasificación de textos: LAMA y BinaryCLF. En comparación con MAML, que adapta el modelo a través del descenso de gradiente, nuestro método aprovecha el sesgo inductivo de los LM previamente entrenados para realizar la coincidencia de patrones, y supera al MAML en un puntaje AUC-ROC promedio absoluto de $6\\% $ en BinaryCLF, ganando más ventaja al aumentar el tamaño del modelo. En comparación con el aprendizaje en contexto no ajustado (es decir, provocar un LM sin procesar), el ajuste en contexto meta-entrena al modelo para que aprenda de ejemplos en contexto. En BinaryCLF, ICT mejora el puntaje promedio de AUC-ROC en un total de $10\\ %$ y reduce la varianza debido al pedido de ejemplos en 6 veces y las opciones de ejemplo en 2 veces.', 'pt': 'O objetivo do meta-aprendizagem é aprender a se adaptar a uma nova tarefa com apenas alguns exemplos rotulados. Inspirado pelo progresso recente em grandes modelos de linguagem, propomos $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), que reformula a adaptação e a previsão de tarefas como um problema simples de previsão de sequência: para formar a sequência de entrada, concatenamos a instrução da tarefa , exemplos no contexto rotulados e a entrada de destino para prever; para meta-treinar o modelo para aprender com exemplos no contexto, ajustamos um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado (LM) para prever o rótulo de destino dada a sequência de entrada em uma coleção de tarefas.\nNós comparamos nosso método em duas coleções de tarefas de classificação de texto: LAMA e BinaryClfs. Comparado ao MAML, que adapta o modelo por meio de gradiente descendente, nosso método aproveita o viés indutivo de LMs pré-treinados para realizar correspondência de padrões e supera o MAML por uma pontuação AUC-ROC média absoluta de $ 6\\%$ em BinaryClfs, ganhando mais vantagem com o aumento tamanho do modelo. Comparado ao aprendizado no contexto não ajustado (ou seja, solicitando um LM bruto), o ajuste no contexto metatreina o modelo para aprender com exemplos no contexto. No BinaryClfs, o ICT melhora a pontuação média do AUC-ROC em $10\\%$ absolutos e reduz a variação devido ao pedido de exemplo em 6x e escolhas de exemplo em 2x.', 'fr': "L'objectif du méta-apprentissage est d'apprendre à s'adapter à une nouvelle tâche avec seulement quelques exemples étiquetés. Inspirés par les récents progrès réalisés dans les grands modèles de langage, nous proposons $\xa0\\ textit {in-context tuning} $ (ICT), qui redéfinit l'adaptation et la prédiction des tâches comme un simple problème de prédiction de séquence\xa0: pour former la séquence d'entrée, nous concaténons l'instruction de tâche, les exemples contextuels étiquetés et l'entrée cible dans prédire\xa0; pour méta-entraîner le modèle à apprendre à partir d'exemples contextuels, nous affinons un modèle de langage pré-entraîné (LM) afin de prédire l'étiquette cible en fonction de la séquence d'entrée d'un ensemble de tâches.\nNous comparons notre méthode sur deux ensembles de tâches de classification de texte\xa0: LAMA et BinaryCLFS. Comparée à la MAML qui adapte le modèle par descente de gradient, notre méthode tire parti du biais inductif des LM préentraînés pour effectuer une correspondance de modèle, et surpasse la MAML d'un score AUC-ROC moyen absolu de 6$\xa0\\ %$ sur BinaryCLFS, gagnant ainsi plus d'avantages avec l'augmentation de la taille du modèle. Comparé à l'apprentissage en contexte non affiné (c'est-à-dire à l'aide d'un LM brut), le réglage en contexte met en forme le modèle pour qu'il apprenne à partir d'exemples contextuels. Sur BinaryCLFS, ICT améliore le score AUC-ROC moyen de 10$\xa0\\ %$ absolus, et réduit la variance due à l'ordre des exemples par 6 et aux choix d'exemples par 2.", 'hi': 'मेटा-लर्निंग का लक्ष्य केवल कुछ लेबल किए गए उदाहरणों के साथ एक नए कार्य के अनुकूल होना सीखना है। बड़े भाषा मॉडल में हाल की प्रगति से प्रेरित होकर, हम $\\textit{in-context ट्यूनिंग}$ (आईसीटी) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक साधारण अनुक्रम भविष्यवाणी समस्या के रूप में कार्य अनुकूलन और भविष्यवाणी को फिर से तैयार करता है: इनपुट अनुक्रम बनाने के लिए, हम कार्य निर्देश को संयोजित करते हैं, संदर्भ में लेबल किए गए उदाहरण, और पूर्वानुमान लगाने के लिए लक्ष्य इनपुट; इन-कॉन्टेक्स्ट उदाहरणों से सीखने के लिए मॉडल को मेटा-ट्रेन करने के लिए, हम कार्यों के संग्रह पर इनपुट अनुक्रम दिए गए लक्ष्य लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल (एलएम) को ठीक करते हैं।\nहम पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों के दो संग्रहों पर अपनी विधि बेंचमार्क करते हैं: लामा और BinaryClfs। MAML की तुलना में जो ग्रेडिएंट वंश के माध्यम से मॉडल को अनुकूलित करता है, हमारी विधि पैटर्न मिलान करने के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एलएम के आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रह का लाभ उठाती है, और BinaryClfs पर एक पूर्ण $ 6 \\% $ औसत AUC-ROC स्कोर द्वारा MAML को मात देती है, जिससे मॉडल आकार में वृद्धि के साथ अधिक लाभ प्राप्त होता है। गैर-ठीक-ट्यून किए गए इन-कॉन्टेक्स्ट लर्निंग (यानी एक कच्चे एलएम को प्रेरित करने) की तुलना में, इन-कॉन्टेक्स्ट ट्यूनिंग मेटा-इन-कॉन्टेक्स्ट उदाहरणों से सीखने के लिए मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करता है। BinaryClfs पर, ICT एक निरपेक्ष $ 10\\%$ द्वारा औसत AUC-ROC स्कोर में सुधार करता है, और 6x द्वारा उदाहरण आदेश और 2x द्वारा उदाहरण विकल्पों के कारण विचरण को कम करता है।', 'zh': '元学者,学之新务也,惟标数事而已。 大言近启,我发$\\textit{in-context tuning}$(ICT),以事应占重构为简序:曰输序,曰连事令,曰上下文示例输; 对模型元教以从上下文中示例学,吾微调其语言(LM),以占给定事合者标之。\n余以两文本类合而试之:LAMA 、 BinaryClfs。 与梯度降而调其 MAML ,吾道用豫 LM 之归偏以行其式,而于 BinaryClfs 上以绝 6\\%$ 之均 AUC-ROC 分数优于 MAML,随其增益而获其胜。 与非微之上下文学(即提示始 LM),上下文调优元训模从上下文中示例中习之。 BinaryClfs之上,ICT减AUC-ROC之均得分绝于10\\%美元,而降示例之方差倍6,示例择减2倍之。', 'ja': 'メタラーニングの目標は、いくつかのラベル付きの例だけで新しいタスクに適応することを学ぶことです。 大規模な言語モデルの最近の進歩に触発されて、$\\ textit {in - context tuning} $ (ICT)を提案します。これは、タスクの適応と予測を簡単なシーケンス予測問題として再構築します。入力シーケンスを形成するために、コンテキスト内の例でラベル付けされたタスクインストラクションとターゲット入力を連結して予測します。コンテキスト内の例から学習するためにモデルをメタトレーニングするために、タスクのコレクションで入力シーケンスが与えられたターゲットラベルを予測するために、事前にトレーニングされた言語モデル(LM)を微調整します。\nLAMAとBinaryClfsという2つのテキスト分類タスクのコレクションでメソッドをベンチマークします。 グラデーション降下を通じてモデルを適応させるMAMLと比較して、当社の方法は、事前に訓練されたLMの誘導バイアスを利用してパターンマッチングを実行し、BinaryClfsで絶対的な$ 6 \\%$平均AUC - ROCスコアでMAMLを上回り、モデルサイズの増加でより優位になります。 微調整されていないコンテキスト内学習（すなわち、生のLMを促す）と比較して、コンテキスト内チューニングは、コンテキスト内の例から学習するためにモデルをメタトレーニングする。 BinaryClfsでは、ICTは平均AUC - ROCスコアを絶対値$ 10 \\%$で向上させ、サンプルの順序付けとサンプルの選択による分散を2倍に削減します。', 'ru': 'Цель метаобучения - научиться адаптироваться к новой задаче с помощью всего нескольких помеченных примеров. Вдохновленные недавним прогрессом в больших языковых моделях, мы предлагаем $\\textit{настройка в контексте}$ (ICT), который пересматривает адаптацию задач и прогнозирование как простую задачу прогнозирования последовательности: чтобы сформировать входную последовательность, мы объединяем инструкцию задачи, помеченную как примеры в контексте, и целевой вход для прогнозирования; чтобы обучить модель на примерах в контексте, мы тонко настраиваем предварительно обученную языковую модель (LM) для прогнозирования целевой метки, учитывая входную последовательность в коллекции задач.\nМы сравниваем наш метод с двумя коллекциями задач классификации текста: LAMA и BinaryClfs. По сравнению с MAML, который адаптирует модель посредством градиентного спуска, наш метод использует индуктивное смещение предварительно обученных LM для выполнения сопоставления шаблонов и превосходит MAML по абсолютному среднему баллу AUC-ROC $ 6\\%$ на BinaryClfs, получая больше преимуществ с увеличением размера модели. По сравнению с неточно настроенным внутриконтекстным обучением (т. е. побуждением необработанного LM), мета-обучение внутриконтекстной настройки обучает модель учиться на внутриконтекстных примерах. В BinaryClfs ИКТ улучшает средний балл AUC-ROC на абсолютное значение $ 10\\%$ и уменьшает дисперсию благодаря примеру упорядочения в 6 раз и примеру выбора в 2 раза.', 'ga': 'Is é sprioc na meitefhoghlama ná foghlaim conas oiriúnú do thasc nua gan ach roinnt samplaí lipéadaithe. Spreagtha ag an dul chun cinn le déanaí ar mhúnlaí móra teanga, molaimid $\\textit{tiúnadh comhthéacs}$ (TFC), a athmhúnlaítear oiriúnú tasc agus tuar mar fhadhb seicheamh simplí a thuar: chun an t-ord ionchuir a fhoirmiú, déanaimid an tasc-teagasc a chomhcheangal , samplaí in-chomhthéacs lipéadaithe, agus an t-ionchur sprice le tuar; Chun an tsamhail a mheit-thraenáil le foghlaim ó shamplaí comhthéacs, déanaimid mionchoigeartú ar mhúnla teanga réamh-oilte (LM) chun an sprioclipéad a thuar i bhfianaise an t-ord ionchuir ar bhailiúchán tascanna.\nDéanaimid ár modh a thagarmharcáil ar dhá bhailiúchán de thascanna aicmithe téacs: LAMA agus BinaryClfs. I gcomparáid le MAML a chuireann an tsamhail in oiriúint trí shliocht grádáin, luann ár modh an claonadh ionduchtach de LManna réamhoilte chun meaitseáil patrún a dhéanamh, agus sáraíonn sé meánscór AUC-ROC de $6\\%$ absalóideach ar BinaryClfs, ag baint leasa as an méadú. méid samhail. I gcomparáid le foghlaim neamh-mhionchoigeartaithe i gcomhthéacs (i.e. LM amh a spreagadh), cuireann meititiúnadh i gcomhthéacs an tsamhail chun foghlaim ó shamplaí i gcomhthéacs. Ar BinaryClfs, feabhsaíonn TFC an meánscór AUC-ROC faoi $10\\%$ absalóideach, agus laghdaítear an t-athraitheas mar gheall ar ordú mar shampla 6x agus roghanna samplacha faoi 2x.', 'hu': 'A metatanulás célja, hogy megtanuljon alkalmazkodni egy új feladathoz, csak néhány címkézett példával. A nagy nyelvi modellek közelmúltbeli előrehaladására inspirálva javasoljuk a $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), amely a feladat adaptációját és előrejelzését egyszerű szekvencia-előrejelzési problémákként átdolgozza: a bemeneti sorozat kialakításához összekapcsoljuk a feladat utasítását, a kontextusban megjelölt példákkal, és a célbemenetet, amelyet előre kell jósolnunk; Ahhoz, hogy metaképezzük a modellt, hogy tanulhassunk a kontextusban lévő példákból, finomhangoljuk egy előre képzett nyelvi modellt (LM), hogy előrejelezzük a célcímkét egy feladatgyűjtemény beviteli sorozatával.', 'el': 'Ο στόχος της μετα-μάθησης είναι να μάθει να προσαρμόζεται σε μια νέα εργασία με μόνο μερικά επισημασμένα παραδείγματα. Εμπνευσμένοι από την πρόσφατη πρόοδο στα μεγάλα γλωσσικά μοντέλα, προτείνουμε το $\\textit{σε-context tuning}$ (ΤΠΕ), το οποίο αναδιατυπώνει την προσαρμογή και την πρόβλεψη εργασιών ως ένα απλό πρόβλημα πρόβλεψης ακολουθίας: για να διαμορφώσουμε την ακολουθία εισαγωγής, ενώνουμε την εντολή εργασίας, επισημαίνονται παραδείγματα εντός πλαισίου, και την εισαγωγή στόχου για πρόβλεψη. Για την μετα-εκπαίδευση του μοντέλου για να μάθει από παραδείγματα εντός πλαισίου, συντονίζουμε ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο γλώσσας (LM) για να προβλέψουμε την ετικέτα στόχου με βάση την ακολουθία εισαγωγής σε μια συλλογή εργασιών.', 'ka': 'მეტა-სწავლების მიზეზი არის დასწავლა ახალი დავალებისთვის აეპტიფიკაცია მხოლოდ რამდენიმე მაგალითებით. შემდეგ წინასწარმატებული პროგრესი დიდი ენის მოდელში, ჩვენ მინდა $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), რომელიც დავაკეთებს დავაკეთება და წინასწარმატების პრობლემა როგორც საუკეთესო წინასწარმატების პრობლემა: ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ დავაკეთებთ დავაკეთებთ და მოდელს მეტატურად გავიგეთ, რომ კონტექსტურის მაგალითან შესწავლა, ჩვენ წინ შესწავლობული ენის მოდელს (LM) გავაკეთებთ, რომ გავიგეთ მინიშვნელოვანი ელექსტური მოდელს, რომელიც მიიღებ', 'it': "L'obiettivo del meta-apprendimento è quello di imparare ad adattarsi a un nuovo compito con solo pochi esempi etichettati. Ispirati ai recenti progressi nei modelli di grandi lingue, proponiamo $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), che rifusa l'adattamento e la previsione delle attività come un semplice problema di previsione della sequenza: per formare la sequenza di input, concateniamo l'istruzione delle attività, etichettate in-context example, e l'input target da prevedere; Per metaformare il modello per imparare da esempi contestuali, perfezioniamo un modello linguistico pre-addestrato (LM) per prevedere l'etichetta di destinazione data la sequenza di input su una raccolta di attività.", 'kk': 'Мета оқыту мақсаты - жаңа тапсырманы тек бірнеше жарлық мысалдармен адаптау үшін оқыту. Үлкен тіл үлгілерінде жаңа бағдарламасын басқару керек, біз $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) дегенді тапсырманың адаптациясын және тапсырманы қарапайым реттеу мәселесі ретінде қайта жазып көрсетеді. Кіріс ретінін құру үшін, тапсырманың мәліметін түсіндіріп, м Мысалынан оқыту үшін моделін мета-тренинг келтіру үшін, біз тапсырмалар жинақтағы келтірілген нақты жарлығын бақылау үшін алдын- оқыту үшін тіл моделін (LM) бақыладық.', 'lt': 'Metamokymosi tikslas – mokytis prisitaikyti prie naujos užduoties tik su keliais pažymėtais pavyzdžiais. Įkvėpta pastarojo meto pažanga dideliuose kalbų modeliuose, mes siūlome $\\textit{context tuning}$ (IRT), kuriame nauja redakcija apibrėžiama užduočių pritaikymo ir prognozavimo problem a kaip paprasta sekos prognozavimo problema: sukurti įvedimo seką, sutrumpinti užduočių instrukciją, pažymėtą konteksto pavyzdžiais, ir tikslinį įvedimą prognozuoti; kad metamokytume model į mokytis iš kontekstinių pavyzdžių, tiksliai pritaikytume iš anksto parengtą kalbos modelį (LM), kad nuspėtume tikslinę etiketę atsižvelgiant į įėjimo seką užduočių rinkimui.', 'mk': 'Целта на метаучењето е да се научи да се адаптира на нова задача со само неколку обележани примери. Инспириран од неодамнешниот напредок во големите јазички модели, предложуваме $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ИКТ), кој ја реформира адаптацијата на задачите и предвидувањето како едноставен проблем со предвидувањето на секвенцијата: за да се формира вводната секвенца, ние ја концентрираме инструкцијата на задачите, означени во-контекстни примери, и вводот на целта за мета-тренирање на моделот за да се научи од примери во контекст, ние финетизираме предобучен јазички модел (LM) за да ја предвидеме целната етикета со оглед на вводната секвенца на колекција на задачи.', 'ms': 'Tujuan pembelajaran meta ialah belajar untuk menyesuaikan tugas baru dengan hanya beberapa contoh yang ditabel. DiInspirasikan oleh kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam model bahasa besar, kami melamar $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), yang mengubahsuai penyesuaian tugas dan ramalan sebagai masalah ramalan urutan sederhana: untuk membentuk urutan input, kami menyatukan arahan tugas, labeled in-context examples, dan input sasaran untuk ramalkan; untuk melatih-meta model untuk belajar dari contoh-contoh dalam-konteks, kami menyesuaikan model bahasa yang dilatih dahulu (LM) untuk meramalkan label sasaran yang diberikan jujukan input pada koleksi tugas.', 'mt': 'The goal of meta-learning is to learn to adapt to a new task with only a few labeled examples.  Inspired by the recent progress in large language models, we propose $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), which recasts task adaptation and prediction as a simple sequence prediction problem: to form the input sequence, we concatenate the task instruction, labeled in-context examples, and the target input to predict;  biex jitħarreġ meta l-mudell biex jitgħallem minn eżempji fil-kuntest, a ħna nidfinaw mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel (LM) biex nipprevedi t-tikketta fil-mira minħabba s-sekwenza ta’ input fuq ġabra ta’ kompiti.', 'pl': 'Celem meta-learningu jest nauczenie się dostosowywania do nowego zadania za pomocą zaledwie kilku oznaczonych przykładów. Zainspirowani ostatnimi postępami w dużych modelach językowych, proponujemy $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), który przekształca adaptację i predykcję zadań jako prosty problem przewidywania sekwencji: aby utworzyć sekwencję wejściową, łączymy instrukcję zadania, oznaczone w kontekście przykłady i docelowe wejście do przewidywania; Aby metatrenować model, aby uczyć się na przykładach kontekstowych, dostosowujemy wstępnie przeszkolony model językowy (LM), aby przewidzieć docelową etykietę z podaniem sekwencji wejściowej w zbiorze zadań.', 'mn': 'Мета суралцах зорилго бол шинэ ажил дээр зөвхөн хэд хэдэн жишээ нэрлэгдсэн жишээтэй адаптацийг сурах юм. Томоохон хэл загварын саяхан хөгжлийн дасгал нь бид $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) гэсэн санал болгож байна. Энэ нь ажлын адилтгал болон таамаглалыг энгийн дарааллын таамаглалтын асуудал болгон давтагддаг. Ингээд дарааллын дарааллыг бий болгохын тулд бид ажлын загварыг тодорхойлдог. Жишээлбэлээр суралцах загварыг мета-трениролцуулахын тулд бид өмнө суралцагдсан хэл загварыг (LM) тодорхойлохын тулд ажлын цуглуулалтын дарааллаар өгөгдсөн загварын загварыг тодорхойлдог.', 'ro': 'Scopul meta-învățării este de a învăța să se adapteze la o nouă sarcină cu doar câteva exemple etichetate. Inspirat de progresul recent în modelele lingvistice mari, propunem $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), care reformează adaptarea și predicția sarcinilor ca o simplă problemă de predicție a secvenței: pentru a forma secvența de intrare, concatenăm instrucțiunea sarcinii, etichetată în-context exemple, și intrarea țintă de prezis; Pentru a meta-instrui modelul pentru a învăța din exemple în context, ajustăm fin un model lingvistic pre-instruit (LM) pentru a prezice eticheta țintă dată secvența de intrare pe o colecție de sarcini.', 'sr': 'Cilj metaučenja je naučiti se prilagoditi novom zadatku sa samo nekoliko primjera označenih. Inspiran nedavnim napretkom u velikim jezičkim modelima, predlažemo $\\textit{u kontekstu punjenja}$ (ICT), koji ponovo predlaže adaptaciju i predviđanje zadataka kao problem predviđanja jednostavne sekvence: da bi formirali sekvenciju ulaska, potvrdili smo instrukciju zadataka, označenu u kontekstu primjerima i ciljni ulaz za predviđanje; da bi metatrenirali model da naučimo iz kontekstskih primjera, ispravljamo predobučeni jezički model (LM) da predvidimo ciljnu etiketu s obzirom na sekvencu ulaska na kolekciju zadataka.', 'ml': 'The goal of meta-learning is to learn to adapt to a new task with only a few labeled examples.  വലിയ ഭാഷയുടെ മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളാല്\u200d $textit {in-context tuning}$ (ICT) നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് ജോലിയുടെ പ്രവചനത്തിന്റെയും പ്രവചനങ്ങളെയും എളുപ്പമുള്ള പ്രവചനങ്ങളായി പുനരുതുന്നു. ഇന്\u200dപ മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാനുള്ള മാതൃകയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാനുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200d ചെയ്യുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഒരു മുന്\u200dപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d (', 'si': 'මෙටා-ඉගෙනීමේ අරක්\u200dෂාව තමයි අළුත් වැඩක් එක්ක ලේබල් කරපු උදාහරණ ටිකක් විතරයි ඉගෙනීම. අලුත් භාෂා මොඩේල් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා $\\textit{in-Contexttuning}$ (ICT), මෙයා වැඩ සඳහා වැඩ සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය ව මෙටා-ට්\u200dරේන්ස් කරනවා මොඩේලය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් උදාහරණ වලින්, අපි ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාවක් මොඩේලය (LM) විශ්වාස කරන්න ඉලක්ක ලේ', 'so': 'Ujeedada barashada metaalka waa in lagu barto in lagu beddelo shaqada cusub oo ay ku leedahay tusaalooyin yar oo la tababaray oo kaliya. Dhacdooyinkii ugu dambeeyey ee muuqashada luuqada waaweyn, $\\textit {in-context tuning}$ (ICT), kaas oo dib u dhigi kara beddelka shaqada oo la sii sheegi karo dhibaato fudud ah oo la sii sheego, si aan u sameyno xiliga input, waxaynu ku qornaa tilmaamaha shaqada, tusaale ahaan loo qoray, iyo injiilka la soo qoro; si aan u tababarino tusaale ahaan wax uga barano, waxaynu si fiican u qoraynaa model afka hore oo la tababaray (LM) si aan u sii sheegno calaamada goalka lagu qoray dhamaanka waxyaabaha lagu soo ururiyo.', 'sv': 'Målet med meta-lärande är att lära sig anpassa sig till en ny uppgift med bara några få märkta exempel. Inspirerad av de senaste framstegen inom stora språkmodeller föreslår vi $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), som omarbetar uppgiftsjustering och förutsägelse som ett enkelt sekvensförutsägelseproblem: för att bilda inmatningssekvensen sammanfogar vi uppgiftsinstruktionen, märkta in-context exempel, och målindata att förutsäga; För att meta-träna modellen för att lära sig av kontextexempel finjusterar vi en pre-trained language model (LM) för att förutsäga måletiketten givet inmatningssekvensen på en samling uppgifter.', 'no': 'Målet for metalæring er å lære å tilpassa ei ny oppgåve med berre noen eksemplar med merkelappe. På den siste framgang i store språk-modeller, foreslår vi $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), som gjenoppretter oppgåvetilpassing og foregåve som eit enkelt problem for å foregå etter oppgåvefølgje: for å forme innføringsekvensen, samsvarar vi oppgåveinstruksjonen, merket i-konteksteksemplar og målinndata som skal foregå. For å metatrena modellen som skal lærast frå i konteksteksemplar, finn vi ein først treng språk-modell (LM) for å foregå målbiletet som gjev inndata-sekvensen på ei samling av oppgåver.', 'ur': 'مٹا-سیکھنے کا موقع یہ ہے کہ ایک نوی کام کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنے کا سیکھنا صرف چند نئی مثال کے ساتھ ہے۔ بڑی زبان نمڈلوں میں اچھی پیشرفت کی وجہ سے، ہم $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو تابع اضافہ اور پیشنهاد کو ایک ساده سطح پیشنهاد مشکل کے طور پر دوبارہ تغییر دیتا ہے: اضافہ سطح کے طور پر، ہم نے تابع اضافہ کی تغییر کو تغییر دیتے ہیں، مثالوں میں لکھا دیا گیا ہے، اور مٹا-ٹرین کے لئے مدل کی مثالیں سیکھنے کے لئے، ہم ایک پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل (LM) کو تدبیر کرتے ہیں تاکہ ایک کام کے مجموعہ پر اینٹ سٹرن کے مطابق موجود لیبل کو پیش بینی کریں۔', 'ta': 'மெடா கற்றல் குறிப்பிட்ட சில உதாரணங்களுடன் மட்டுமே ஒரு புதிய பணியை ஒப்பிட கற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும். பெரிய மொழி மாதிரியில் சமீபத்தின் முன்னேற்றம் வழங்கப்பட்டது, நாம் $\\textit {in-context tuning}$ (ICT), இது பணியை மாற்றுதல் மற்றும் முன்வெளியீட்டு பிரச்சனையாக மாற்றுகிறது. உள்ளீட்டு விகிதத்தை உருவாக்க, செ சூழல் உதாரணங்களிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ள மாதிரியை மேடி- பயிற்சி செய்வதற்கு, முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி( LM) கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீடு வி', 'vi': 'Mục tiêu của việc học siêu năng là học cách thích nghi với một nhiệm vụ mới chỉ với vài ví dụ được đánh dấu. Dựa trên sự tiến bộ gần đây trong các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn, chúng tôi đề xuất « tham mục nhập » trong ngữ cảnh Độ tham vấn liên kết tần số liên quan liên kết liên kết liên kết liên kết liên kết kết, biến đổi khả năng thích nghi và dự đoán các công việc như một vấn đề dự đoán đơn giản: để tạo ra chuỗi nhập, chúng tôi kết nối hướng dẫn việc, ghi vào trường hợp, và nhập đích cần dự đoán; để meta-huấn luyện mô hình để học từ ví dụ ngữ cảnh, chúng ta sẽ tinh chỉnh một mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo trước (LM) để dự đoán nhãn đích dựa vào chuỗi nhập trong tập các công việc.', 'uz': "Met o'rganish maqsadi, faqat bir necha misol bilan yangi vazifani o'rganish uchun o'rganish. @ info: whatsthis Matn modelini o'rganish mumkin, birinchi taʼminlovchi tildan foydalanuvchi modeli (LM) yordam beramiz, vazifalar to ʻplamda kiritish cheksizni tashkilotda koʻrsatilgan foydalanuvchi yorliqni koʻrsatish uchun.", 'bg': 'Целта на мета-обучението е да се научи да се адаптира към нова задача само с няколко етикетирани примера. Вдъхновени от неотдавнашния напредък в големите езикови модели, ние предлагаме $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ИКТ), който преработва адаптацията и прогнозирането на задачите като прост проблем за прогнозиране на последователността: за да формира входната последователност, ние конкатенираме инструкцията за задачата, обозначени в контекста примери и целевия вход за прогнозиране; за мета-обучение на модела, за да се учи от контекстни примери, ние фино настройваме предварително обучен езиков модел (ЛМ), за да предвидим целевия етикет, като се има предвид последователността на въвеждането на набор от задачи.', 'nl': 'Het doel van meta-learning is om zich aan te passen aan een nieuwe taak met slechts een paar gelabelde voorbeelden. Geïnspireerd door de recente vooruitgang in grote taalmodellen, stellen we $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) voor, dat taakaanpassing en voorspelling herschikt als een eenvoudig sequentievoorspellingsprobleem: om de invoersequentie te vormen, koppelen we de taakinstructie aan elkaar, gelabelde in-context voorbeelden, en de doelinvoer om te voorspellen; Om het model te metatrainen om te leren van in-context voorbeelden, verfijnen we een vooraf getraind taalmodel (LM) om het doellabel te voorspellen met de invoersequentie op een verzameling taken.', 'hr': 'Cilj metaučenja je naučiti se prilagoditi novom zadatku sa samo nekoliko primjera označenih. Uhvaćeni nedavnim napretkom u velikim jezičkim modelima, predlažemo $\\textit{u kontekstu punjenja}$ (ICT), koji pretpostavlja prilagodbu zadataka i predviđanje kao problem predviđanja jednostavne sekvence: kako bi formirali ulaznu sekvencu, potvrdili smo uputu zadataka, označeni u kontekstu primjerima i ciljni ulaz za predviđanje; da bi metatrenirali model da naučimo iz kontekstskih primjera, ispravljamo predobučeni jezički model (LM) kako bi predvidjeli ciljnu etiketu s obzirom na ulaznu sekvencu o kolekciji zadataka.', 'da': 'Målet med meta-læring er at lære at tilpasse sig en ny opgave med kun få mærkede eksempler. Inspireret af de seneste fremskridt inden for store sprogmodeller foreslår vi $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), som omarbejder opgavetilpasning og forudsigelse som et simpelt sekvensforudsigelsesproblem: For at danne inputsekvensen sammenkæder vi opgaveinstruktionen, mærket in-context eksempler, og målinput at forudsige; For at metatræne modellen til at lære af eksempler i sammenhæng finjusterer vi en prætrænet sprogmodel (LM) for at forudsige målmærket givet input sekvensen på en samling af opgaver.', 'de': 'Ziel des Meta-Learning ist es, mit nur wenigen beschrifteten Beispielen zu lernen, sich an eine neue Aufgabe anzupassen. Inspiriert von den jüngsten Fortschritten in großen Sprachmodellen schlagen wir $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) vor, das Aufgabenanpassung und Vorhersage als einfaches Sequenzvorhersageproblem umfaßt: Um die Eingabesequenz zu bilden, verketten wir die Aufgabenanweisung, beschriftete In-Kontext Beispiele und die Zieleingabe, die vorhergesagt werden soll; Um das Modell so zu trainieren, dass es aus kontextbezogenen Beispielen lernt, optimieren wir ein vortrainiertes Sprachmodell (LM), um das Ziellabel anhand der Eingabesequenz für eine Aufgabensammlung vorherzusagen.', 'id': 'Tujuan meta-belajar adalah belajar untuk mengadaptasi tugas baru dengan hanya beberapa contoh yang ditabel. Terinspirasi oleh kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam model bahasa besar, kami mengusulkan $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), yang mengubah adaptasi dan prediksi tugas sebagai masalah prediksi urutan sederhana: untuk membentuk urutan input, kami menyatukan instruksi tugas, labeled in-context examples, dan target input untuk prediksi; to meta-train the model to learn from in-context examples, we fine-tune a pre-trained language model (LM) to predict the target label given the input sequence on a collection of tasks.', 'ko': '원 학습의 목표는 새로운 임무에 적응하는 것을 습득하는 것이다. 단지 몇 개의 표기된 예만 있으면 된다.대형 언어 모델의 최신 진전의 계발을 받아 $\\textit{in context tuning}$(ICT)를 제시했습니다. 이것은 작업 적응과 예측을 간단한 서열 예측 문제로 재정의했습니다. 입력 서열을 형성하기 위해 상하문에 표시된 작업 지령과 목표 입력을 연결하여 예측합니다.컨텍스트 예제에서 학습할 수 있도록 미리 훈련된 언어 모델(LM)을 미세하게 조정하여 지정된 임무 집합에 입력된 시퀀스의 대상 레이블을 예측합니다.', 'fa': 'هدف یادگیری متا این است که یاد بگیرید که با یک کار جدید با فقط چند مثال مورد علامت قرار گرفته باشید. توسط پیشرفت اخیر در مدل\u200cهای زبان بزرگ، پیشنهاد $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) می\u200cکنیم، که به عنوان مشکل پیش\u200cبینی و پیش\u200cبینی کار را به عنوان یک مشکل پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی ساده بازسازی می\u200cکند: برای تولید دستور ورودی، ما دستور وظیفه\u200cی وظیفه\u200cی وظیفه\u200cی وض برای آموزش مدل برای یاد گرفتن از مثالهای مختلف، یک مدل زبان پیش آموزش (LM) را برای پیش بینی کردن نقاشی هدف را که به عنوان دستور ورودی در یک مجموعه کار داده می\u200cشود تغییر می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Lengo la kujifunza kwa meta ni kujifunza kulingana na kazi mpya yenye mifano michache tu yenye utambulisho. Kuhamasishwa na maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika mifano makubwa ya lugha, tunapendekeza $\\textit {in-context tuning}$ (ICT), ambayo inarudisha mabadiliko ya kazi na kutabiri kama tatizo rahisi la kutabiri: kutengeneza mfululizo wa ujasiri, tunaunganisha maelekezo ya kazi, inayoonyesha kwa muktadha, na namna ya kutabiri; ili kufundisha mtindo wa kujifunza kutoka kwa mifano yenye muktadha, tunatunza vizuri kwa mtindo wa lugha iliyoendelea (LM) kutabiri alama ya lengo la kuandika mfululizo wa input kwenye mkusanyiko wa kazi.', 'tr': 'Meta-öwrenmeniň maksady diňe bir näçe mysal bilen täze bir zada üýtgetmekdir. Ullakat dil nusgalarynda son günlerde täze ilerleme tarapyndan, biz $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) teklip edýäris. Bu zadyň adaptasiýasyny we öngörümlerini basit bir terjime meselesi diýip täsir edýäris: girdi dinamasyny bejermek üçin, zadyň düzgünini çykýarys, örneklerde etitlenýän we öngörülmek üçin maksady girişini tapýarys; Baglanyş örneklerinden öwrenmek üçin modelini meta-trenlemek üçin, başlangyç işleriniň toplumynda berilen maksady etiketini öwrenmek üçin önüne düzenleyiriz.', 'af': "Die doel van meta-leer is om te leer om aan 'n nuwe taak te pas met slegs 'n paar etiketeerde voorbeelde. Inspireer deur die onlangse vordering in groot taal modele, voorstel ons $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), wat herstel taak aanpassing en voorskou as 'n eenvoudige volgorde voorskou probleem: om die invoer volgorde te formeer, stel ons die taak instruksie, etiket in-context voorbeelde en die doel invoer om voorskou te maak; na meta-trein die model om te leer van in-konteks voorbeelde, fin-tuneer ons 'n voorafgevorderde taal model (LM) om die doel etiket te voorskou wat die invoer reeks gegee is op 'n versameling van taak.", 'sq': 'Qëllimi i meta-mësimit është të mësohet të përshtatet me një detyrë të re me vetëm disa shembuj të etiketuar. Inspired by the recent progress in large language models, we propose $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), which recasts task adaptation and prediction as a simple sequence prediction problem: to form the input sequence, we concatenate the task instruction, labeled in-context examples, and the target input to predict;  për të metatrainuar model in për të mësuar nga shembujt e kontekstit, ne rregullojmë një model gjuhësh të paratrajnuar (LM) për të parashikuar etiketën objektive të dhënë sekuencën e hyrjes në një koleksion detyrash.', 'am': 'የመተማር ጉዳዩ ጥቂት ምሳሌዎች ብቻ ጋር አዲስ ስራ ለመማር ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ የቋንቋ አካባቢ ፕሮግራም በብዛት ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ማስታወቂያውን እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ ማድረግ እና ምሳሌውን ለመማር፣ ለቀድሞ ተማርነው የቋንቋ ሞዴል (LM) የተሰኘውን የግንኙነቱ ምልክት በስራ ክፍል ላይ የተሰኘውን መጠቀሚያ ለመጠየቅ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մետասովորելու նպատակն է սովորել հարմարվել նոր խնդրին միայն մի քանի պիտակ օրինակների հետ: Հոգեշնչված մեծ լեզվի մոդելների վերջին զարգացումից, մենք առաջարկում ենք $\\Texit{in-the-տեքստ Tuning}$ (ԻԿԹ), որը վերաձևավորում է աշխատանքի ադապտացիան և կանխատեսումը որպես պարզ հաջորդականության կանխատեսման խնդիր. որպեսզի ձևավորենք ներմուծի հաջորդականությունը, մենք համընկնում ենք աշխատանքի ուսուց որպեսզի մետավարժեցնենք մոդելը, որպեսզի սովորենք կոնտեքստի օրինակներից, մենք բարելավում ենք նախավարժեցված լեզվի մոդելը (LM), որպեսզի կանխագուշակենք նպատակային պիտակը, հաշվի առնելով առաջադրանքների հավաքածու', 'az': 'Meta-öyrənməsinin məqsədi ancaq bir neçə məsəl ilə yeni bir işə uyğunlaşmağı öyrənməkdir. Böyük dil modellərində son tədbir təşkilində təşkil edilmişdir, biz $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT) təklif edirik ki, iş uyğunluğunu və tədbirləri basit seçmə problemi olaraq yenidən təşkil edir: giriş seçməsi üçün, işləri müəyyən edirik, məsəllərində etiket edilmiş, və tədbirlərin təşkil edilməsi üçün məqsəd girişini təş məsəllərdən öyrənmək üçün modeli meta-təhsil etmək üçün, öyrənmiş dil modelini (LM) təhsil etmək üçün məqsəd etiketini təhsil edirik.', 'bn': 'মেটা-শিক্ষার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি নতুন কাজের সাথে যুক্ত করতে শিখা যায়, যার মাত্র কয়েকটি চিহ্নিত উদাহরণ। বিশাল ভাষার মডেলে সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতির দ্বারা আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি $ টেক্সটিট {in-context tuning}$(ICT)$ (যেটি কাজের অ্যাডাপেটশন এবং ভবিষ্যৎবাণী একটি সাধারণ সেকেন্ড ভবিষ্যতের সমস্যা হিসেবে পুনরায় প্রস্তাব করে পূর্বপূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল (এলএম) থেকে শিক্ষা প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য মডেলের ট্রেনিং ট্রেনিং করার জন্যে আমরা ভালোভাবে প্রশিক্ষণিত একটি ভাষার মড', 'bs': 'Cilj metaučenja je naučiti se prilagoditi novom zadatku sa samo nekoliko primjera označenih. Inspiran nedavnim napretkom u velikim jezičkim modelima, predlažemo $\\textit{u kontekstu punjenja}$ (ICT), koji ponovno pretpostavlja adaptaciju i predviđanje zadataka kao problem predviđanja jednostavne sekvence: kako bi formirali sekvencu ulaska, potvrdili smo instrukciju zadataka, etiketiranu u kontekstu primjere i ciljni ulaz za predviđanje; da bi metatrenirali model da naučimo iz kontekstskih primjera, ispravljamo predobučeni jezički model (LM) da predvidimo ciljnu etiketu s obzirom na sekvencu ulaska na kolekciju zadataka.', 'ca': "L'objectiu del meta-aprenentatge és aprendre a adaptar-se a una nova tasca amb només alguns exemples etiquetats. Inspirat pels progrés recents en grans models de llenguatge, proposem $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (TIC), que recasta l'adaptació a les tasques i la predicció com un simple problema de predicció de seqüències: per formar la seqüència d'entrada, concatenem l'instrucció de tasques, etiquetats exemples en-context, i l'entrada d'objectiu a predir; per metatreinar el model per aprendre d'exemples en contexte, ajuntem un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat (LM) per predir l'etiqueta d'objectiu dada la seqüència d'entrada d'una col·lecció de tasques.", 'cs': 'Cílem meta-learningu je naučit se adaptovat na nový úkol pouze s několika označenými příklady. Inspirováni nedávným pokrokem ve velkých jazykových modelech navrhujeme $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), který přepracovává adaptaci a predikci úkolů jako jednoduchý problém predikce sekvence: pro vytvoření vstupní sekvence řetězíme instrukci úkolů, označené v kontextu příklady a cílový vstup k predikci; Abychom model metatrénovali tak, aby se učil z kontextových příkladů, jemně ladíme předškolený jazykový model (LM), abychom předpověděli cílový štítek s ohledem na vstupní sekvenci na kolekci úkolů.', 'et': 'Metaõppe eesmärk on õppida kohanema uue ülesandega vaid mõne märgistatud näitega. Inspireerituna hiljutistest edusammudelitest suurtes keelemudelites, pakume välja $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), mis sõnastab ülesannete kohandamise ja prognoosimise lihtsa jada prognoosimise probleemina: sisendijada moodustamiseks ühendame ülesandejuhised, kontekstisisesed näited ja prognoosimise sihtsisendid; Selleks, et mudelit metakoolitada, et õppida kontekstipõhistest näidetest, täpsustame eelõpetatud keelemudelit (LM), et ennustada sihtmärki, arvestades sisendjärjestust ülesannete kogumis.', 'fi': 'Meta-oppimisen tavoitteena on oppia sopeutumaan uuteen tehtävään vain muutamalla merkittyllä esimerkillä. Suurten kielimallien viimeaikaisen kehityksen innoittamana ehdotamme $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), joka muotoilee tehtävien mukauttamisen ja ennustamisen yksinkertaiseksi sekvenssin ennustusongelmaksi: syötesakson muodostamiseksi yhdistämme tehtäväohjeet, asiayhteydelliset esimerkit ja ennustettavat kohdesyötteet. Meta-kouluttaaksemme mallia oppimaan kontekstin esimerkeistä, hienosäädämme esikoulutetun kielimallin (LM) ennustamaan kohdetarraa, kun otetaan huomioon syöttösekvenssi tehtäväkokoelmassa.', 'ha': "Gani na karanta meta-meta ne dõmin a kwaɗayi wa wani aikin da aka sani kawai da misãlai kaɗan. An Inspire mafarin da ke ƙara cikin misalin harshe masu girma, za'a buɗa $ text tit[in-context tuning] $ (ICT), wanda ke riƙe wa gyare-adadin aikin da kuma gabatarwa kamar wata matsayi na basĩri na sauri: don ka danne suran cikin cikin shirin da za'a yi amfani da shi, za'a sami wa shirin da aka ƙayyade shi cikin mazaɓa, da kuma an gabatar da cikin shirin da za'a yi amfani da shi; to meta-train the model to learn from in-context examples, we fine-tune a pre-trained language model (LM) to predict the target label given the input sequence on a collection of tasks.", 'sk': 'Cilj meta učenja je, da se naučimo prilagoditi na novo nalogo z le nekaj označenimi primeri. Na podlagi nedavnega napredka pri velikih jezikovnih modelih predlagamo $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), ki prilagajanje in napoved opravil preoblikuje kot preprost problem napovedi zaporedja: za oblikovanje vhodnega zaporedja združimo navodila za opravilo, označene v kontekstu primere in ciljni vhod za napoved; Za metausposabljanje modela, da bi se učili iz kontekstnih primerov, smo natančno nastavili vnaprej usposobljen jezikovni model (LM), da bi napovedali ciljno oznako glede na vhodno zaporedje v zbirki opravil.', 'jv': 'goal of meta-Learn is to install a new task with only a little label for example. #CIDUU to meta-stretch the model to Learn from in-context samples, we Fine-tune a advanced language model (LM) to preview the goal label given the input order on a gateway of tasks.', 'he': 'המטרה של מטה-למידה היא ללמוד להתאים למשימה חדשה עם רק כמה דוגמאות מסוימות. בהשראה מההתקדמות האחרונה בדוגמנים לשפה גדולים, אנו מציעים $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), אשר מחדש מציין התאמה ומחזיקה משימה כבעיה פשוטה של חיזוי רצף: כדי ליצור את רצף הכניסה, אנו מציינים את ההוראות המשימה, תווים בדוגמאות בתוך הקשר, וההכניסה המטרה לחזוי; כדי לאמן את המודל במטה ללמוד מדוגמאות בקשר, אנחנו מתאימים מודל שפה מאומן מראש (LM) כדי לחזות את תווית המטרה שנתנה את רצף הכניסה על אוסף משימות.', 'bo': 'The goal of meta-learning is to learn to adapt to a new task with only a few labeled examples. Inspired by the recent progress in large language models, we propose $\\textit{in-context tuning}$ (ICT), which recasts task adaptation and prediction as a simple sequence prediction problem: to form the input sequence, we concatenate the task instruction, labeled in-context examples, and the target input to predict; and to meta-train the model to learn from in-context examples, we fine-tune a pre-trained language model (LM) to predict the target label given the input sequence on a collection of tasks.'}
{'en': 'Direct Speech-to-Speech Translation With Discrete Units', 'ar': 'حان دور الذكاء الاصطناعي لطرح سؤال على البشر: إنشاء زوج من الأسئلة والأجوبة لكتب قصص الأطفال', 'es': 'Es el turno de la IA de hacer una pregunta a los humanos: generación de pares de preguntas y respuestas para libros de cuentos infantiles', 'pt': 'É a vez da IA fazer uma pergunta aos humanos: geração de pares de perguntas e respostas para livros de histórias infantis', 'fr': "C'est au tour de l'IA de poser une question aux humains\xa0: génération de paires questions-réponses pour les livres d'histoires pour enfants", 'ja': '人間に問いかけるのはAIのターン：子どもの物語本の質問と答えのペア世代', 'hi': 'यह मनुष्यों से एक सवाल पूछने के लिए एआई की बारी है: बच्चों की कहानी पुस्तकों के लिए प्रश्न-उत्तर जोड़ी पीढ़ी', 'zh': '今AI问于人:童子故事书问生', 'ru': 'Настала очередь ИИ задавать людям вопрос: Поколение вопросов-ответных пар для детских книг с рассказами', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le AI Ceist a chur ar Dhaoine: Giniúint Péire Ceisteanna-Freagra do Leabhair Scéalta Leanaí', 'ka': 'ადამიანებისთვის კითხვა: კითხვა-პასუხისთვის კონფიგურაცია ბავშვების ისტორიის კონფიგურაციისთვის', 'it': "È il turno dell'IA di porre una domanda agli umani: generazione di coppie domande-risposte per libri di storie per bambini", 'el': 'Είναι η σειρά της τεχνητής νοημοσύνης να κάνει στους ανθρώπους μια ερώτηση: Γενιά ζευγαριών ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων για παιδικά βιβλία ιστοριών', 'hu': 'Az AI sora, hogy kérdést tegyen az embereknek: Kérdés-Válasz Párgeneráció a gyermek történetkönyvekhez', 'mk': 'Свртот на Ал е да им постави прашање на луѓето: генерација на парови на одговори на прашања за книги за детски приказни', 'kk': 'Адамдарға сұрақ сұрау: Балалардың оқиғалары үшін сұрақ-жауап жауап беру', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരോട് ഒരു ചോദ്യം ചോദിക്കാന്\u200d AI തിരിച്ചുനോക്കുന്നതാണ്: കുട്ടികളുടെ കഥ പുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200d', 'lt': 'Tai AI eilė užduoti žmonėms klausimą: klausimų ir atsakymų parių generacija vaikų istorijų knygoms', 'ms': 'Ini giliran AI untuk menanyakan soalan kepada manusia: Generasi pasangan soalan-jawapan untuk buku cerita kanak-kanak', 'mt': 'Huwa d-dawl tal-AI li jistaqsi lill-Bniedem Mistoqsija: Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Pawġi b’Rispons għall-mistoqsijiet tat-tfal', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний түүхийн номын хувьд асуулт асуух нь AI-ын эргэлт:', 'pl': 'Kolej na AI, aby zadać ludziom pytanie: Generacja par pytań-odpowiedzi dla książek opowieści dziecięcych', 'ro': 'Este rândul AI să pună oamenilor o întrebare: Generația de perechi de întrebări-răspuns pentru cărțile de povești pentru copii', 'sr': 'AI je okrenut da pita ljude pitanje: Generacija pitanja i odgovor za pare za knjige priče o djeci', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අහන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්-ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන්ගේ කතාවක් පොත්තුවක්', 'so': "It's the AI's turn to ask people to su'aal: Questions-answers feer generation generation for books of story caruurta", 'no': 'Det er ein spørsmål for å spørja mennesker: Spørsmål- svar- par generering for båndes historiske bokar', 'sv': 'Det är AI:s tur att ställa en fråga till människor: Fråga-svar Pargeneration för barnberättelser', 'ur': 'یہ AI کی توریت ہے کہ انسانوں سے ایک سوال پوچھے: سوال اور جواب دو نسل بچوں کی کہانی کتابوں کے لیے', 'ta': 'இது மனிதர்களை ஒரு கேள்வி கேட்க AI திரும்புகிறது: குழந்தைகளின் வரலாற்று புத்தகங்களுக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கப்படுகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đó là phiên bản của AI để hỏi con người một câu hỏi: Thế hệ sao câu hỏi cho các s ách Chuyện trẻ em', 'bg': 'Време е на изкуствения интелект да зададе на хората въпрос: поколение двойки въпроси-отговори за детски книги с приказки', 'hr': 'AI je okrenut pitati ljude pitanje: generacija pitanja i odgovor za pare za knjige priče o djeci', 'da': "Det er AI's tur til at stille mennesker et spørgsmål: Spørgsmål og svar Pargeneration til børns historiebøger", 'nl': 'Het is de beurt van AI om mensen een vraag te stellen: Vraag-antwoord koppelgeneratie voor kinderverhaalboeken', 'de': 'KI ist an der Reihe, Menschen eine Frage zu stellen: Frage-Antwort-Paargeneration für Kinderbücher', 'ko': '이제 인공지능이 인간에게 물어볼 차례다. 어린이 이야기책의 퀴즈 대 생성', 'id': "It is AI's Turn to Ask Humans a Question: Question-Answer Pair Generation for Children's Story Books", 'fa': 'نوبت AI است که از مردم سوال بپرسد: نسل جواب دو جواب برای کتاب داستان بچه ها', 'sw': 'Ni Movement of AI to Question humans: Question answers Generation of ujira kwa ajili ya Vitabu vya Habari vya Watoto', 'sq': "Ă‹shtĂ« rradha e AI-s Ă« pĂ«r t'u bĂ«rĂ« njerĂ«zve njĂ« pyetje: gjenerata e Ă§ifteve pĂ«r pyetje-pĂ«rgjigje pĂ«r librat e tregimeve tĂ« fĂ«mijĂ«ve", 'am': 'የሰዎች ጥያቄን ለመጠየቅ የዓል ዘር ነው፡፡ ጥያቄ ለልጆች ታሪክ መጽሐፍ የመልስ ትውልድ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'ԱԲ-ի ծրագիրն է մարդկանց հարց տալ. հարց-պատասխան հարց-պատասխան պատմությունների գրքերի երկու սերունդը', 'az': 'İnsanlara bir sual soruşmaq üçün AI tərəfindir: Çocukların hekayələri üçün sual-cavab verən iki nəsil', 'bn': 'এটা মানুষকে একটি প্রশ্ন জিজ্ঞাসা করার প্রতি আল প্রত্যাবর্তন: শিশুদের গল্প বই জন্মের প্রশ্ন- উত্তর প্রজন্ম', 'bs': 'AI je okrenut da pita ljudima pitanje: generacija pitanja i odgovora par za knjige priče o djeci', 'ca': "És la Xira d'AI de fer una pregunta als humans: generació de parells de preguntes per llibres d'històries infantils", 'af': "Dit is AI se Skakel om mense te vra 'n Vrag: Vrag-Antwoord Pair Generasie vir Kinderse se Historieboeke", 'tr': "AI'nin s özü Adam'a sorag soramak: sorag-jogap Çagalaryň hekaýa kitaplary üçin Paýlaşmak", 'cs': 'Je na řadě AI položit lidem otázku: Generace dvojic otázek-odpověď pro dětské knihy příběhů', 'et': 'On AI kord küsida inimestelt küsimus: küsimus-vastus paari põlvkond laste luguraamatute jaoks', 'fi': 'On tekoälyn vuoro kysyä ihmisiltä kysymys: kysymys-vastaus parin sukupolvi lasten satukirjoille', 'jv': 'buddy', 'sk': 'Je na vrsti umetne inteligence, da postavi ljudi vprašanje: Generacija vprašanj-odgovor par za otroške knjige zgodb', 'he': 'זה תורו של AI לשאול את בני האדם שאלה: דנרציה של זוגות תשובות-שאלות לספרי סיפורים לילדים', 'ha': 'AI yana kasancẽwa ya tambayi mutãne wani tambayi:', 'bo': "It is AI's Turn to Ask Humans a Question: Question-Answer Pair Generation for Children's Story Books"}
{'en': 'We present a direct speech-to-speech translation (S2ST) model that translates speech from one language to speech in another language without relying on intermediate text generation. We tackle the problem by first applying a self-supervised discrete speech encoder on the target speech and then training a sequence-to-sequence speech-to-unit translation (S2UT) model to predict the discrete representations of the target speech. When target text transcripts are available, we design a joint speech and text training framework that enables the model to generate dual modality output (speech and text) simultaneously in the same inference pass. Experiments on the Fisher Spanish-English dataset show that the proposed framework yields improvement of 6.7 BLEU compared with a baseline direct S2ST model that predicts spectrogram features. When trained without any text transcripts, our model performance is comparable to models that predict spectrograms and are trained with text supervision, showing the potential of our system for translation between unwritten languages.', 'ar': 'يتم إنشاء تقنيات الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) الحالية بشكل أساسي للإجابة على الأسئلة التي يطرحها البشر. ولكن في التطبيقات التعليمية ، يحتاج المعلمون غالبًا إلى تحديد الأسئلة التي يجب عليهم طرحها لمساعدة الطلاب على تحسين قدراتهم على فهم السرد. نصمم نظامًا آليًا لتوليد الأسئلة والأجوبة (QAG) لسيناريو التعليم هذا: نظرًا لكتاب قصة من روضة الأطفال إلى الصف الثامن كمدخل ، يمكن لنظامنا تلقائيًا إنشاء أزواج ضمان الجودة القادرة على اختبار مجموعة متنوعة من الأبعاد مهارات الفهم لدى الطالب. يتم عرض بنية نموذج QAG المقترحة باستخدام مجموعة بيانات FairytaleQA الجديدة المشروحة من قبل الخبراء ، والتي تحتوي على 278 كتابًا قصصيًا مناسبًا للأطفال مع 10580 زوجًا من QA. تُظهر التقييمات التلقائية والبشرية أن نموذجنا يتفوق في الأداء على أحدث أنظمة QAG الأساسية. علاوة على نظام QAG الخاص بنا ، بدأنا أيضًا في إنشاء تطبيق سرد القصص التفاعلي لنشر العالم الحقيقي في المستقبل في هذا السيناريو التعليمي.', 'es': 'Las técnicas de respuesta a preguntas (QA) existentes se crean principalmente para responder a las preguntas de los humanos. Pero en las aplicaciones educativas, los maestros a menudo necesitan decidir qué preguntas deben hacer para ayudar a los estudiantes a mejorar sus capacidades de comprensión narrativa. Diseñamos un sistema automatizado de generación de preguntas y respuestas (QAG) para este escenario educativo: dado un libro de cuentos desde el jardín de infantes hasta el octavo grado como entrada, nuestro sistema puede generar automáticamente pares de control de calidad que son capaces de probar una variedad de dimensiones de las habilidades de comprensión de un estudiante. Nuestra arquitectura de modelo QAG propuesta se demuestra mediante un nuevo conjunto de datos FairyTaleQA anotado por expertos, que tiene 278 libros de cuentos aptos para niños con 10 580 pares de control de calidad. Las evaluaciones automáticas y humanas muestran que nuestro modelo supera a los sistemas de referencia de QAG de última generación. Además de nuestro sistema QAG, también comenzamos a crear una aplicación interactiva de narración de historias para la futura implementación en el mundo real en este escenario educativo.', 'pt': 'As técnicas existentes de resposta a perguntas (QA) são criadas principalmente para responder a perguntas feitas por humanos. Mas em aplicativos educacionais, os professores geralmente precisam decidir quais perguntas devem fazer, a fim de ajudar os alunos a melhorar suas capacidades de compreensão narrativa. Projetamos um sistema automatizado de geração de perguntas e respostas (QAG) para este cenário educacional: dado um livro de histórias do jardim de infância à oitava série como entrada, nosso sistema pode gerar automaticamente pares de QA que são capazes de testar uma variedade de dimensões de um habilidades de compreensão do aluno. Nossa arquitetura de modelo de QAG proposta é demonstrada usando um novo conjunto de dados FairytaleQA anotado por especialistas, que tem 278 livros de histórias para crianças com 10.580 pares de QA. Avaliações automáticas e humanas mostram que nosso modelo supera os sistemas de linha de base QAG de última geração. Além do nosso sistema QAG, também começamos a construir um aplicativo interativo de contar histórias para a futura implantação no mundo real neste cenário educacional.', 'fr': "Les techniques existantes de réponse aux questions (AQ) sont créées principalement pour répondre aux questions posées par les humains. Mais dans les applications pédagogiques, les enseignants doivent souvent décider des questions qu'ils doivent poser, afin d'aider les élèves à améliorer leurs capacités de compréhension narrative. Nous concevons un système de génération automatique de questions-réponses (QAG) pour ce scénario éducatif\xa0: avec un livre d'histoires de la maternelle au niveau 8 comme entrée, notre système peut générer automatiquement des paires d'AQ capables de tester diverses dimensions des compétences de compréhension d'un élève. L'architecture du modèle QAG que nous proposons est démontrée à l'aide d'un nouveau jeu de données FairyTaleQA annoté par des experts, qui comprend 278 livres de contes adaptés aux enfants avec 10 580 paires d'assurance qualité. Les évaluations automatiques et humaines montrent que notre modèle surpasse les systèmes de base QAG de pointe. En plus de notre système QAG, nous commençons également à créer une application interactive de narration pour le déploiement futur dans le monde réel dans ce scénario éducatif.", 'ja': '既存の質疑応答（ QA ）技術は、主に人間からの質問に答えるために作成される。しかし、教育アプリケーションでは、学習者の物語理解能力を向上させるのに役立つために、教師はしばしば質問すべき質問を決定する必要がある。私たちは、この教育シナリオのための自動質問回答生成（ QAG ）システムを設計します。幼稚園から8年生のレベルのストーリーブックを入力として与えると、私たちのシステムは、学習者の理解スキルのさまざまな次元をテストすることができるQAペアを自動的に生成することができます。提案されているQAGモデルアーキテクチャは、新しい専門家が注釈を付けたFairytaleQAデータセットを使用して実演されています。このデータセットには、10,580のQAペアを備えた278の子供向けストーリーブックがあります。自動および人間による評価は、当社のモデルが最先端のQAGベースラインシステムよりも優れていることを示しています。QAGシステムに加えて、この教育シナリオにおける将来の現実展開のためのインタラクティブなストーリーテリングアプリケーションの構築も開始します。', 'zh': '今之问答(QA)术者,所以应人之所生也。 然教之用也,师必有所问,以赞叙事理解能力。 设自问生(QAG)系统:给定一本自幼儿园至八年级故事书为输,自生QA对,QA试诸生理解能力维度。 臣等所建 QAG 模架构用新注 FairytaleQA 数集演之,当数集有 278 童故事书与 10,580 QA 对。 自与人工评,先入 QAG 基线系统。 于我 QAG 统之上,始构一交互式讲故事之应用程序,施于将来教场之实。', 'hi': 'मौजूदा प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) तकनीकें मुख्य रूप से मनुष्यों द्वारा पूछे गए सवालों के जवाब देने के लिए बनाई जाती हैं। लेकिन शैक्षिक अनुप्रयोगों में, शिक्षकों को अक्सर यह तय करने की आवश्यकता होती है कि उन्हें कौन से प्रश्न पूछने चाहिए, ताकि छात्रों को अपनी कथा समझ क्षमताओं में सुधार करने में मदद मिल सके। हम इस शिक्षा परिदृश्य के लिए एक स्वचालित प्रश्न-उत्तर पीढ़ी (क्यूएजी) प्रणाली डिजाइन करते हैं: किंडरगार्टन से आठवीं कक्षा के स्तर पर इनपुट के रूप में एक कहानी पुस्तक को देखते हुए, हमारी प्रणाली स्वचालित रूप से क्यूए जोड़े उत्पन्न कर सकती है जो छात्र की समझ कौशल के विभिन्न आयामों का परीक्षण करने में सक्षम हैं। हमारे प्रस्तावित QAG मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर को एक नए विशेषज्ञ-एनोटेटेड फेयरीटेलक्यूए डेटासेट का उपयोग करके प्रदर्शित किया गया है, जिसमें 10,580 क्यूए जोड़े के साथ 278 बच्चे के अनुकूल स्टोरीबुक हैं। स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल अत्याधुनिक क्यूएजी बेसलाइन सिस्टम को मात देता है। हमारे QAG प्रणाली के शीर्ष पर, हम इस शैक्षिक परिदृश्य में भविष्य की वास्तविक दुनिया की तैनाती के लिए एक इंटरैक्टिव कहानी कहने वाले एप्लिकेशन का निर्माण करना भी शुरू करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Существующие методы ответа на вопросы (QA) создаются в основном для ответов на вопросы, задаваемые людьми. Но в образовательных приложениях учителям часто приходится решать, какие вопросы они должны задавать, чтобы помочь учащимся улучшить свои способности к пониманию повествования. Мы разрабатываем автоматизированную систему генерации вопросов и ответов (QAG) для этого сценария обучения: учитывая книгу рассказов в детском саду до восьмого класса в качестве входных данных, наша система может автоматически генерировать пары QA, которые способны тестировать различные измерения навыков понимания учеником. Предлагаемая нами архитектура модели QAG демонстрируется с использованием нового набора данных FairytaleQA с аннотациями экспертов, который содержит 278 дружественных детям книг с 10 580 парами QA. Автоматические и человеческие оценки показывают, что наша модель превосходит современные базовые системы QAG. В дополнение к нашей системе QAG мы также начинаем создавать интерактивное приложение для повествования историй для будущего реального развертывания в этом образовательном сценарии.', 'ga': 'Cruthaítear teicníochtaí freagartha ceisteanna (QA) go príomha chun ceisteanna a chuireann daoine a fhreagairt. Ach in iarratais oideachais, is minic a bhíonn ar mhúinteoirí cinneadh a dhéanamh ar na ceisteanna ba cheart dóibh a chur, chun cabhrú le daltaí a gcumas tuisceana inste a fheabhsú. Dearaímid córas giniúna ceist-freagra uathoibrithe (QAG) don chás oideachais seo: nuair a chuirtear leabhar scéalta ag an kindergarten go leibhéal an ochtú grád mar ionchur, is féidir lenár gcóras péirí QA a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch atá in ann toisí éagsúla a thástáil. scileanna tuisceana an dalta. Léirítear ár n-ailtireacht mhúnla QAG atá beartaithe ag baint úsáide as tacar sonraí FairytaleQA nua anótáilte ó shaineolaithe, a bhfuil 278 leabhar scéil ann atá oiriúnach do leanaí agus 10,580 péire QA. Léiríonn meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna go sáraíonn ár samhail na córais bunlíne QAG atá ar an gcéad dul síos. Anuas ar ár gcóras QAG, cuirimid tús freisin le feidhmchlár idirghníomhach scéalaíochta a thógáil le haghaidh imscaradh sa saol fíor sa todhchaí sa chás oideachais seo.', 'hu': 'A meglévő kérdésre válaszoló technikák elsősorban az emberek által feltett kérdések megválaszolására szolgálnak. Az oktatási alkalmazásokban azonban a tanároknak gyakran el kell dönteniük, hogy milyen kérdéseket kell feltenniük, hogy segítsék a diákokat abban, hogy fejlesszék narratív megértési képességeiket. Ehhez az oktatási forgatókönyvre automatizált kérdés-válasz generációs rendszert (QAG) tervezünk: ha bemenetként az óvodában a nyolcadik osztályos szinten történőkönyvet adunk, rendszerünk automatikusan képes olyan minőségi párokat generálni, amelyek képesek tesztelni a diák megértésének különböző dimenzióit. Javasolt QAG modell architektúránkat egy új, szakértői megjegyzésekkel ellátott FairytaleQA adatkészlet segítségével mutatjuk be, amely 278 gyermekbarát történetkönyvet tartalmaz 10 580 QA párral. Az automatikus és emberi értékelések azt mutatják, hogy modellünk felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb QAG alapvető rendszereket. A QAG rendszerünk tetején egy interaktív történetmesélő alkalmazás kiépítését is elkezdjük ebben az oktatási forgatókönyvben.', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες τεχνικές απάντησης ερωτήσεων (QA) δημιουργούνται κυρίως για να απαντήσουν σε ερωτήσεις που θέτουν οι άνθρωποι. Αλλά στις εκπαιδευτικές εφαρμογές, οι εκπαιδευτικοί συχνά πρέπει να αποφασίσουν ποιες ερωτήσεις πρέπει να θέσουν, προκειμένου να βοηθήσουν τους μαθητές να βελτιώσουν τις δυνατότητες αφηγηματικής κατανόησης τους. Σχεδιάζουμε ένα αυτοματοποιημένο σύστημα δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων (QAG) για αυτό το εκπαιδευτικό σενάριο: δεδομένου ενός βιβλίου ιστοριών στο νηπιαγωγείο μέχρι το επίπεδο της 8ης δημοτικού ως εισαγωγή, το σύστημά μας μπορεί αυτόματα να δημιουργήσει ζεύγη QA που είναι σε θέση να δοκιμάσουν ποικίλες διαστάσεις των δεξιοτήτων κατανόησης ενός μαθητή. Η προτεινόμενη αρχιτεκτονική μοντέλου καταδεικνύεται χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων παραμυθιών με σχόλια εμπειρογνωμόνων, το οποίο έχει 278 φιλικά προς τα παιδιά βιβλία με ζεύγη ποιότητας 10,580. Οι αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα βάσης QAG. Εκτός από το σύστημά μας, αρχίζουμε επίσης να χτίζουμε μια διαδραστική εφαρμογή αφήγησης ιστοριών για τη μελλοντική ανάπτυξη πραγματικού κόσμου σε αυτό το εκπαιδευτικό σενάριο.', 'ka': 'მსგავსი კითხვის გასაგება (QA) ტექნოგიები შექმნილია სამუშაოდ ადამიანების გასაგებლად. მაგრამ განსწავლებელი პროგრამებში მასწავლებლებელი უნდა გადაწყვეტით რა კითხვები უნდა იყოს, რომ სტუდენტებს შეუძლიათ გაუკეთოთ ისეთი სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა ჩვენ ავტომატიური კითხვების შესახებ (QAG) სისტემა ამ განსწავლების სინარიოსთვის დავყენებთ: ბავშვების კონფიგურაცია 8 წლის დონეზე, როგორც ჩვენი სისტემა შეუძლია ავტომატიურად შექმნა QA კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის განსხვავება ჩვენი QAG მოდელური აქტიქტიკური მოდელური გამოყენება ახალი ექსპერტის ამონიტურებული FairytaleQA მონაცემები, რომელიც 278 ბავშვების მოსახულებელი ისტორიები 10 580 QA ზოგებით. ავტომატიკური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებები ჩვენი მოდელის გავაკეთება QAG-ის ფესტური სისტემები. ჩვენი QAG სისტემის დამატებით, ჩვენ ასევე დავიწყებთ ინტერაქტიგური ისტორიების განსახულებელი პროგრამის მომავალზე რეალური მსოფლიოს გამოყენება ამ განახლებელი სინარიოში', 'it': "Le tecniche esistenti di risposta alle domande (QA) sono create principalmente per rispondere alle domande poste dagli esseri umani. Ma nelle applicazioni educative, gli insegnanti spesso devono decidere quali domande devono porre, al fine di aiutare gli studenti a migliorare le loro capacità di comprensione narrativa. Progettiamo un sistema automatico di generazione domanda-risposta (QAG) per questo scenario educativo: dato un libro di storie all'asilo al livello ottavo come input, il nostro sistema può generare automaticamente coppie di QA che sono in grado di testare una varietà di dimensioni delle capacità di comprensione di uno studente. La nostra architettura modello QAG proposta è dimostrata utilizzando un nuovo dataset FairytaleQA annotato da esperti, che dispone di 278 storybook adatti ai bambini con 10.580 coppie QA. Le valutazioni automatiche e umane dimostrano che il nostro modello supera i sistemi di base QAG all'avanguardia. Oltre al nostro sistema QAG, iniziamo anche a costruire un'applicazione interattiva di storytelling per la futura distribuzione nel mondo reale in questo scenario educativo.", 'lt': 'Esami atsakymo į klausimus metodai yra sukurti daugiausia atsakant į žmonių užduotus klausimus. But in educational applications, teachers often need to decide what questions they should ask, in order to help students to improve their narrative understanding capabilities.  Šio švietimo scenarijaus at žvilgiu sukuriame automatizuotą klausimų ir atsakymų generacijos (QAG) sistemą: atsižvelgiant į istorijų knygą vaikų sode iki a štuntojo klasės lygio kaip įnašą, mūs ų sistema automatiškai gali sukurti QA poros, kurios gali išbandyti įvairius studento supratimo įgūdžių matmenis. Mūsų siūloma QAG modelio architektūra įrodoma naudojant naują ekspertų anotuotą FairytaleQA duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra 278 vaikams palankios istorijos knygos su 10 580 QA poromis. Automatiniai ir žmogaus vertinimai rodo, kad mūsų modelis yra geriausias nei naujausios QAG bazinės sistemos. Be mūsų QAG sistemos, mes taip pat pradedame kurti interaktyvią istorijų pasakojimo programą būsimam realaus pasaulio dislokavimui šiame švietimo scenarijuje.', 'mk': 'Постојаните техники за одговор на прашања (QA) се создадени главно за одговор на прашањата поставени од луѓето. Но, во образовните апликации, професорите честопати мора да одлучат кои прашања треба да постават, со цел да им помогнат на студентите да ги подобрат нивните способности за раскажување. Ние дизајнираме автоматизиран систем за генерација на одговори на прашања (QAG) за овој образовен сценарио: со оглед на книгата за приказни во градината на осмо одделение како влог, нашиот систем може автоматски да генерира парови на QA кои се способни да тестираат различни димензии на способностите за разбирање на студентит Нашата предложена архитектура за модел на QAG е демонстрирана со користење на нов експертски анатиран FairytaleQA датотек, кој има 278 детски пријателски книги со 10.580 парови QA. Automatic and human evaluations show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art QAG baseline systems.  На врвот од нашиот систем на QAG, исто така почнуваме да изградиме интерактивна апликација за раскажување приказни за идното распоредување на реалниот свет во овој образовен сценарио.', 'kk': 'Бар сұрақтар жауап беру (QA) техникалары адамдардың сұрақтарына жауап беру үшін құрылады. Бірақ білім беру қолданбаларында мұғалімдер қандай сұрақтарын түсінуге көмектесу үшін, оқушылардың оқиғаларын түсінуге көмектесу үшін қандай сұрақтарын шешіру Біз бұл білім сценариясының автоматты сұрақ жауаптарды құру жүйесін құрастырамыз: балалардың кітапшасы 8- сынып келтірілген деңгейінде, жүйеміз оқиғалардың түрлі өлшемдерін тексеру мүмкіндігін автоматты түрде QA екептерін құрастыра алады. Біздің QAG үлгі архитектурамыз жаңа эксперттен белгілеген FairytaleQA деректер жиынын қолдану үшін көрсетіледі. Оның 278 балаларға жақсы журналы 10 580 QA жиыны бар. Автоматты және адамдардың оқу үлгіміздің QAG негізгі жүйелерінің күйін жасайтынын көрсетеді. QAG жүйесіміздің жоғарында, сондай-ақ білім беру сценариясындағы келесі әлемді жұмыс істеу үшін интерактивті оқиға айтқан қолданбаны құру бастадық.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം (ക്യൂഎ) സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d മുഖേന മനുഷ്യരോട് ചോദിച്ച ച ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പക്ഷെ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിനുള്ള പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d, അധികാരികള്\u200d എന്താണ് ചോദിക്കേണ്ടതെന്ന് തീരുമാനിക്കേണ്ടത്, വിദ്യാര്\u200dത ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ സാന്നിധ്യത്തിനുവേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയമായി ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം തലമുറയുടെ സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. കിന്\u200dറര്\u200dഗര്\u200dട്ടെനില്\u200d എട്ടാം ഗ്രേഡ് വരെ ഒരു കഥ പുസ്തക ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്യൂഎജി മോഡല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റര്\u200d പുതിയ വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫെയിറിയാറ്റല്\u200d സെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പ്രകടനം  സ്വയം മനുഷ്യരുടെയും വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ക്യുഎജി ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ഓഫ് ചെയ്യ നമ്മുടെ ക്യൂഎജി സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിന്റെ പ്രോഗ്രാപ്തിയില്\u200d ഒര', 'mt': "It-tekniki eżistenti għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) jinħolqu l-aktar biex iwieġbu mistoqsijiet li jsiru mill-bnedmin. Iżda fl-applikazzjonijiet edukattivi, l-għalliema spiss ikollhom jiddeċiedu liema mistoqsijiet għandhom jagħmlu, sabiex jgħinu lill-istudenti jtejbu l-kapaċitajiet tagħhom ta’ fehim narrattiv. We design an automated question-answer generation (QAG) system for this education scenario: given a story book at the kindergarten to eighth-grade level as input, our system can automatically generate QA pairs that are capable of testing a variety of dimensions of a student's comprehension skills.  L-arkitettura tal-mudell QAG proposta tagħna tintwera bl-użu ta’ sett ta’ dejta ġdid ta’ FairytaleQA annotat minn esperti, li għandu 278 storybook favur it-tfal b’10,580 par QA. Evalwazzjonijiet awtomatiċi u umani juru li l-mudell tagħna huwa aktar avvanzat mis-sistemi ta’ linja bażi tal-QAG. Minbarra s-sistema tagħna tal-QAG, aħna nibdew nibnu wkoll applikazzjoni interattiva li tgħid l-istoriji għall-użu futur fid-dinja reali f’dan ix-xenarju edukattiv.", 'ms': 'Teknik menjawab soalan (QA) yang ada dicipta terutama untuk menjawab soalan yang ditanya oleh manusia. Tetapi dalam aplikasi pendidikan, guru sering perlu memutuskan soalan apa yang mereka patut tanya, untuk membantu pelajar untuk meningkatkan kemampuan pemahaman narratif mereka. Kami merancang sistem generasi soalan-jawapan automatik (QAG) untuk skenario pendidikan ini: diberikan buku cerita di taman kanak-kanak hingga tahap kelapan sebagai input, sistem kami boleh secara automatik menghasilkan pasangan QA yang mampu menguji berbagai-bagai dimensi kemampuan pemahaman pelajar. Arkitektur model QAG yang kami cadangkan dipaparkan menggunakan set data FairytaleQA yang baru yang dicatat oleh pakar, yang mempunyai 278 buku cerita yang ramah dengan kanak-kanak dengan 10,580 pasangan QA. Evaluasi automatik dan manusia menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui sistem asas QAG state-of-the-art. Di atas sistem QAG kita, kita juga mula membina aplikasi interaktif cerita-cerita untuk penerbangan dunia nyata masa depan dalam skenario pendidikan ini.', 'mn': 'Ингээд суралцах (QA) технологи нь ихэвчлэн хүмүүсийн асуулт асуусан асуултуудад хариулт өгөх болно. Гэхдээ боловсролын хэрэглээнд багш нар сурагчдад юу асуулт асуух ёстой вэ гэдгийг шийдэх хэрэгтэй. Бид энэ боловсролын хувилбарын автоматжуулан асуулт хариултын төлөвлөгөө (QAG) системийг зохион бүтээж байна: хүүхдийн салбарт 8-р ангийн түвшинд түүх ном өгсөн учраас бидний систем оюутнуудын ойлголтын чадварын олон хэмжээсүүдийг шалгаж чадах QA хоёрыг автоматжуулж чадна Бидний QAG загварын загварын архитектур нь шинэ мэргэжилтэн дээр нэрлэгдсэн FairytaleQA өгөгдлийн санг ашиглаж, 278 хүүхдүүдийн найз зохиолын түүхийг 10,580 QA хоёр авсан. Автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнууд бидний загвар QAG-ын суурь тогтолцооны систем дээр ажилладаг. QAG системийн дээд бид мөн энэ боловсролын хувилбарт ирээдүйн жинхэнэ дэлхийн хөгжлийн тухай интерактив түүх ярьж эхэлсэн.', 'pl': 'Istniejące techniki odpowiedzi na pytania (QA) są tworzone głównie w celu odpowiedzi na pytania zadawane przez ludzi. Ale w aplikacjach edukacyjnych nauczyciele często muszą zdecydować, jakie pytania powinni zadać, aby pomóc uczniom w poprawie ich zdolności narracyjnego zrozumienia. Projektujemy zautomatyzowany system generowania pytań-odpowiedzi (QAG) dla tego scenariusza edukacyjnego: jako wejście dany jest książka historii w przedszkolu do ósmej klasy, nasz system może automatycznie generować pary QA, które są w stanie sprawdzić różne wymiary umiejętności zrozumienia ucznia. Proponowana architektura modelu QAG została przedstawiona przy użyciu nowego, adnotacyjnego zestawu danych FairytaleQA, który zawiera 278 przyjazne dla dzieci opowieści z parami 10,580 QA. Automatyczne i ludzkie oceny pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa najnowocześniejsze systemy bazowe QAG. Oprócz naszego systemu QAG zaczynamy również budować interaktywną aplikację opowiadania historii do przyszłego wdrożenia w świecie rzeczywistym w tym scenariuszu edukacyjnym.', 'ro': 'Tehnicile existente de răspuns la întrebări (QA) sunt create în principal pentru a răspunde la întrebările adresate de oameni. Dar în aplicațiile educaționale, profesorii trebuie adesea să decidă ce întrebări ar trebui să pună, pentru a ajuta elevii să-și îmbunătățească capacitățile de înțelegere narativă. Proiectăm un sistem automat de generare a întrebărilor-răspunsurilor (QAG) pentru acest scenariu educațional: având în vedere o carte de povești la grădiniță la nivelul clasei a opta ca input, sistemul nostru poate genera automat perechi de QA capabile să testeze o varietate de dimensiuni ale abilităților de înțelegere a unui elev. Arhitectura modelului QAG propusă este demonstrată folosind un nou set de date FairytaleQA adnotat de experți, care are 278 de povești prietenoase cu copii, cu 10.580 perechi QA. Evaluările automate și umane arată că modelul nostru depășește sistemele de bază QAG de ultimă generație. Pe lângă sistemul nostru QAG, începem, de asemenea, să construim o aplicație interactivă de povestire pentru implementarea viitoare în lumea reală în acest scenariu educațional.', 'no': 'Det eksisterande spørsmålstekk (QA) er oppretta hovudsakelig for å svara på spørsmål spurte av menneske. Men i utdanningsprogrammer må lærarar ofte bestemme kva spørsmål dei skal spørja, for å hjelpa studenten til å forbetra sine historiske forståking. Vi design eit automatisk oppføring av spørsmål-svar (QAG) system for denne utdanningsfenarioen: gitt ein historiebok på bærgarten til åttegradsverdi som inndata, kan systemet vårt automatisk lage QA-par som kan testa mange dimensjonar av forståkingsverdiane til ein student. Vårt foreslått QAG-modellarkitektur er demonstrert med ein ny ekspert-annoterart FairytaleQA-dataset, som har 278 barnebrukar med 10 580 QA-par. Automatiske og menneskelige evalueringar viser at modellen vårt utfører QAG-baselinjesystemet. På høve av vårt QAG-systemet begynner vi også å bygge eit interaktivt storytisk program for framtidige verdensutvikling i denne utdanningsfunksjonen.', 'sr': 'Postoje tehnike odgovora na pitanje (QA) stvorene su uglavnom da bi odgovorili na pitanja koje su postavljali ljudi. Ali u obrazovnim aplikacijama, učitelji često moraju odlučiti koje pitanja bi trebali postaviti, kako bi pomogli studentima da poboljšaju svoja prièa o razumijevanju. Mi dizajniramo automatski sistem generacije odgovora na pitanje (QAG) za ovaj scenario obrazovanja: s obzirom na knjigu priče u vrtiću do osmog razreda kao input, naš sistem može automatski stvoriti par QA koji su sposobni da testiraju razne dimenzije razumevanja učenika. Naša predložena arhitektura modela QAG pokazuje se koristeći novi komplet podataka FairytaleQA-a, koji ima 278 prijatnih priča za djecu sa 10.580 QA pare. Automatske i ljudske procjene pokazuju da naš model izvršava početne sisteme stanja umjetnosti QAG-a. Na vrhu našeg QAG sistema, takoðe počinjemo da izgradimo interaktivnu prièu prièajuæi aplikaciju za buduænost razvoja stvarnog sveta u ovom obrazovnom scenariju.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර (QA) තාක්ෂණය සිද්ධ වෙනවා මිනිස්සු වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200d නමුත් ශික්ෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරයෝගයක් වලින්, ගුරුවරුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තීරණය කරන්න ඕනේ ඔවුන් මොන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අහන්න අපි ස්වායංචිත ප්\u200dරශ්න-උත්තර පද්ධතිය (QAG) පද්ධතියක් සිද්ධානය කරන්නේ මේ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dය අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ QAG මෝඩල් ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අලුත් විශ්වාසිත විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dය ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක QAG පද්ධ අපේ QAG පද්ධතියේ ඉහළට, අපි අනාගතයේ ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ අනාගතයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පටන් ගත්තා.', 'so': "Isku jawaabta su'aalaha (QA) waxaa loo abuuraa si ugu badan in ay uga jawaabaan su'aalo ay dadku weyddiiyaan. Laakiin codsiga waxbarashada macallimiinta inta badan waa inay go'aan su'aalaha ay weydiin lahaayeen, si ay u caawiyaan ardayda si ay u hagaajiyaan awoodooda waxgarashada sheekooyinka. Waxaan qoraynaa nidaam ka jawaabta su'aalaha (QAG) oo iskuulladan u eg: buug sheeko ah oo ku qoran barbaarinta barbaarinta ilaa darafka siddeedaad, nidaamkayaga ayaa si bilowga ah u abuuri kara QA labo ah oo awoodi kara inuu imtixaamo noocyo kala duduwan aqoonta aasaasiga ah. QA dataset, kaas oo leh 278 storyboor-friendly caruurta oo leh 10,580 QA labo. Qiimeynta dhaqso ah iyo dadka waxay muuqataa in modelkeenu uu sameeyo nidaamka aasaasiga ah ee QAG-da-art. Sidoo kale waxaynu bilaabaynaa inaan dhisno codsi faa'iido ku saabsan taariikhda kala duwan ee loo soo diro nolosha weligeed ah ee mustaqbalka ah ee arimahan waxbarashada.", 'sv': 'Befintliga frågeställningstekniker skapas främst för att besvara frågor som ställs av människor. Men i pedagogiska tillämpningar behöver lärare ofta bestämma vilka frågor de ska ställa, för att hjälpa eleverna att förbättra sina berättande förståelse förmåga. Vi utformar ett automatiserat fråge-svar genereringssystem (QAG) för detta utbildningsscenario: givet en berättelsebok på dagis till åttonde klass som input, kan vårt system automatiskt generera QA par som kan testa en mängd olika dimensioner av en elevs förståelse färdigheter. Vår föreslagna QAG-modellarkitektur demonstreras med hjälp av en ny expertkommenterad FairytaleQA-dataset, som har 278 barnvänliga sagoböcker med 10 580 QA-par. Automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar visar att vår modell överträffar de senaste QAG-standardsystemen. Utöver vårt QAG-system börjar vi också bygga en interaktiv story-telling applikation för framtida implementering i den verkliga världen i detta utbildningsscenario.', 'ur': 'موجود سوال جواب دینے کے لئے (QA) ٹیکنیک بنائے جاتے ہیں، سب سے انسان کے سوال جواب دینے کے لئے۔ لیکن تعلیم کاروباروں میں، استاد اکثر فیصلہ کرنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ ان سے کس سوال پوچھنا چاہیں، تاکہ ان کی کہانیاں سمجھنے کے قابلیت اچھی طرح کی مدد کریں. ہم نے اس تعلیم سناریو کے لئے اپنا سؤال-جواب سناریو (QAG) سیسٹم کی طراحی کیا ہے: بچھونڈ کے گرٹن میں آٹھ کلاس سطح کے طور پر ایک کہانی کتاب دی گئی ہے، ہماری سیسٹم کو اپنا سامان QA جوڑے پیدا کر سکتا ہے جو ایک طالب کی سمجھ کے طاقتوں کی مختلف اندازے کی آزمائش کرنے کے قابل ہیں. ہماری پیشنهاد کی QAG موڈل معماری مثال ایک نوی متخصص فایریٹیل کیا ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق دکھائی جاتی ہے جس کے پاس 278 بچوں کے دوست دار داستانوں کی صحیح 10.580 کیا جوڑوں کے ساتھ ہے. آٹوٹی اور انسان کی ارزیابی دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل QAG بنسٹ لین سیستموں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے QAG سیسٹم کے اوپر، ہم نے اس تحصیل سناریو میں ایک پیچیدگی داستان پڑھنے والی اپنا کاروبار بنانا شروع کیا ہے۔', 'ta': 'இருக்கும் கேள்வி பதில் (QA) தொழில்நுட்பத்தை முக்கியமாக மனிதர்கள் கேட்கும் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் உருவா ஆனால் கல்வி பயன்பாடுகளில், ஆசிரியர் இந்த கல்வி நிலைக்கான தானாகவே கேள்வி பதில் உருவாக்கும் அமைப்பை நாம் வடிவமைக்கிறோம்: கிளைனர்கார்டென்டில் இருந்து எட்டு வகுப்பு மட்டத்தில் ஒரு கதை புத்தகம் கொடுத்துள்ளோம், எங்கள QA தகவல் அமைப்பு 278 குழந்தைகள் நண்பர்களாக இருக்கும் கட்டுப்பாடுகள் 10,580 கியூஏ ஜோடிகளுடன் உள்ளது. தானாகவே மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பீடுகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் மாதிரி QAG அடிப்படை முறைமைகளை வெளியே செயல்படுத்துகிறது. எங்கள் QAG அமைப்பின் மேல், நாங்கள் இந்த கல்வி பார்வையில் எதிர்காலத்தின் உண்மையான உலக விருப்பங்களுக்கு ஒரு இடைவெளி கதை சொல்', 'uz': "Mavjud savol javob beruvchi texnologiya oddiy insonlar savollariga javob berish uchun yaratiladi. Lekin ta'lim dasturlarida, o'qituvchilar doim nima savollarini o'rganish kerak, o'quvchilarga o'qituvchilarga o'rganish qobiliyatlarini oshirish uchun. Biz bu ta'lim scenarida avtomatik savol javob yaratish (QAG) tizimini yaratib, o'smimiz o'qituvchiga 8 darajadagi bir tarixi kitob yaratganimiz, biz tizimmizni avtomatik o'zgartirib chiqarishimiz mumkin, va o'quvchi ta'limning bir xil darajasini tekshirish mumkin. QA маълумотлари маълумотлари асосида 278 бола-friendly storybooks 10,580 QA жуфти бўлган янги маълумотлар асосида кўрсатилган. Avto- aniqlash va inson qiymatlari modelimiz QAG asosiy tizimlarini bajaradi. On top of our QAG system, we also start to build an interactive story-telling application for the future real-world deployment in this educational scenario.", 'vi': 'Các kỹ thuật trả lời câu hỏi tồn tại (QA) được tạo ra chủ yếu để trả lời câu hỏi của con người. Nhưng trong các ứng dụng giáo dục, giáo viên thường phải quyết định những câu hỏi họ nên hỏi, để giúp học sinh cải thiện khả năng thấu hiểu câu chuyện. Chúng tôi thiết kế một hệ thống câu hỏi tự động (QAG) cho bối cảnh giáo dục này: một cuốn truyện ở trường mẫu giáo lên lớp lớp lớp tám như nhập, hệ thống của chúng tôi có thể tự động tạo ra các cặp câu hỏi có khả năng thử các chiều rộng của kỹ năng thấu hiểu của học sinh. Cách kiến trúc mô hình QAG bày tỏ chúng ta với một tập tin người Tiên Tri được ghi chú mới, gồm 27 các câu chuyện thân thiết với 10,5450 QA Bản đánh giá tự động và con người cho thấy mẫu hoàn thiện hệ cơ bản QAG hiện đại nhất. Thêm vào hệ thống QG, chúng ta cũng bắt đầu xây dựng một chương trình kể chuyện tương ứng cho triển khai thực tế trong trường học này.', 'hr': 'Postoje tehnike odgovora na pitanje (QA) stvorene su uglavnom za odgovor na pitanja koje su postavljali ljudi. Ali u obrazovnim aplikacijama, učitelji često moraju odlučiti koje pitanja trebaju postaviti, kako bi pomogli studentima da poboljšaju svoje priče razumijevanje. Mi dizajniramo automatski sistem generacije odgovora na pitanje (QAG) za ovaj scenario obrazovanja: s obzirom na knjigu priče u djetinjskoj arteniji do osmog razreda kao ulaz, naš sistem može automatski stvoriti par QA-a koji su sposobni testirati razne dimenzije vještina razumijevanja učenika. Naša predložena arhitektura modela QAG pokazuje se koristeći novi komplet podataka FairytaleQA-a, koji ima 278 priče o djetetima s 10 580 QA parovima. Automatske i ljudske procjene pokazuju da naš model iznosi početne sustave stanja umjetnosti QAG-a. Na vrhu našeg QAG sustava, također počinjemo izgraditi interaktivnu priču izjavu za buduću razvoj stvarnog svijeta u ovom obrazovnom scenariju.', 'nl': 'Bestaande vragen beantwoorden (QA) technieken zijn vooral ontwikkeld om vragen te beantwoorden die door mensen worden gesteld. Maar in educatieve toepassingen moeten docenten vaak beslissen welke vragen ze moeten stellen, om studenten te helpen hun verhalende begripsvermogen te verbeteren. Voor dit onderwijsscenario ontwerpen we een geautomatiseerd vraag-antwoord-genereringssysteem (QAG): als input van een verhaalboek op kleuterschool tot achtste klas kan ons systeem automatisch QA-paren genereren die in staat zijn om een verscheidenheid aan dimensies van de begripsvaardigheden van een student te testen. Onze voorgestelde QAG-modelarchitectuur wordt gedemonstreerd met behulp van een nieuwe door experts geannoteerde FairytaleQA-dataset, die 278 kindvriendelijke verhaalboeken heeft met 10,580 QA-paren. Automatische en menselijke evaluaties tonen aan dat ons model beter presteert dan state-of-the-art QAG baseline systemen. Naast ons QAG systeem gaan we ook een interactieve storytelling applicatie bouwen voor de toekomstige real-world implementatie in dit educatieve scenario.', 'da': 'Eksisterende spørgsmålsbesvarelsesteknikker (QA) skabes hovedsageligt for at besvare spørgsmål stillet af mennesker. Men i uddannelsesmæssige applikationer skal lærere ofte beslutte, hvilke spørgsmål de skal stille, for at hjælpe eleverne med at forbedre deres fortælling forståelse evner. Vi designer et automatiseret spørgsmål-svar generation (QAG) system til dette uddannelsesscenario: Med en historiebog på børnehaven til ottende klasse niveau som input, kan vores system automatisk generere QA par, der er i stand til at teste en række dimensioner af en elevs forståelse færdigheder. Vores foreslåede QAG model arkitektur demonstreres ved hjælp af et nyt ekspertanmærket FairytaleQA datasæt, som har 278 børnevenlige historiebøger med 10.580 QA par. Automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer viser, at vores model overgår state-of-the-art QAG baseline systemer. Ud over vores QAG-system begynder vi også at bygge en interaktiv historiefortællingsapplikation til den fremtidige virkelige implementering i dette uddannelsesscenario.', 'bg': 'Съществуващите техники за отговор на въпроси са създадени главно за отговор на въпроси, зададени от хората. Но в образователните приложения учителите често трябва да решат какви въпроси трябва да зададат, за да помогнат на учениците да подобрят способностите си за разказване. Ние проектираме автоматизирана система за генериране на въпроси и отговори за този образователен сценарий: дадена книга с приказки в детската градина до осми клас като вход, нашата система може автоматично да генерира двойки за контрол на качеството, които са способни да тестват различни измерения на уменията за разбиране на ученика. Нашата предложена архитектура на модела е демонстрирана с помощта на нов експертно анотиран набор от данни, който разполага с 278 детски истории с 10 580 двойки. Автоматични и човешки оценки показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда най-съвременните базови системи. Освен нашата система ние също започваме да изграждаме интерактивно приложение за разказване на истории за бъдещото внедряване в реалния свят в този образователен сценарий.', 'de': 'Bestehende Fragebeantwortechniken (QA) werden hauptsächlich entwickelt, um Fragen zu beantworten, die von Menschen gestellt werden. Aber in Bildungsanwendungen müssen Lehrer oft entscheiden, welche Fragen sie stellen sollen, um den Schülern zu helfen, ihr narratives Verständnis zu verbessern. Für dieses Bildungsszenario entwickeln wir ein automatisiertes Frage-Antwort-Generierungssystem (QAG): Mit einem Storybuch im Kindergarten bis zur achten Klasse als Input kann unser System automatisch QA-Paare generieren, die in der Lage sind, eine Vielzahl von Dimensionen des Verständnisses eines Schülers zu testen. Unsere vorgeschlagene QAG-Modellarchitektur wird anhand eines neuen, von Experten kommentierten FairytaleQA-Datensatzes demonstriert, der 278 kinderfreundliche Storybooks mit 10,580 QA-Paaren enthält. Automatische und menschliche Auswertungen zeigen, dass unser Modell moderne QAG-Basissysteme übertrifft. Zusätzlich zu unserem QAG-System beginnen wir auch mit dem Aufbau einer interaktiven Storytelling-Anwendung für den zukünftigen realen Einsatz in diesem Bildungsszenario.', 'ko': '기존의 질의응답(QA) 기술은 주로 인간이 제기하는 질문에 답하는 데 쓰인다.그러나 교육 응용에서 교사는 학생들이 서사 이해 능력을 향상시킬 수 있도록 어떤 질문을 해야 할지 결정해야 한다.우리는 이런 교육 장면을 위해 자동 퀴즈 생성(QAG) 시스템을 설계했다. 유치원에서 8학년까지의 이야기책을 입력으로 하고 우리의 시스템은 학생들의 이해 기능을 테스트할 수 있는 다양한 차원의 퀴즈 쌍을 자동으로 생성할 수 있다.우리가 제시한 QAG 모델 구조는 새로운 전문가의 주석인 FairytaleQA 데이터 집합을 이용하여 시범을 보였다. 이 데이터 집합은 278권의 어린이 친선 이야기서로 모두 10580대 QA이다.우리의 가장 선진적인 기선 평가와 QAS 모델은 우리의 가장 선진적인 시스템이 훌륭하게 표현되었다는 것을 보여준다.우리의 QAG 시스템을 토대로 우리는 이러한 교육 장면에서 미래의 실제 배치에 사용할 상호작용 이야기 응용 프로그램을 구축하기 시작했다.', 'id': 'Teknik menjawab pertanyaan (QA) yang ada dibuat terutama untuk menjawab pertanyaan yang ditanyakan oleh manusia. Namun dalam aplikasi pendidikan, guru sering perlu memutuskan pertanyaan apa yang harus mereka tanyakan, untuk membantu siswa untuk meningkatkan kemampuan pemahaman narratif mereka. Kami merancang sistem generasi pertanyaan-jawaban otomatis (QAG) untuk skenario pendidikan ini: diberikan buku cerita di taman anak sampai tingkat kelas delapan sebagai input, sistem kami dapat secara otomatis menghasilkan pasangan QA yang mampu menguji berbagai dimensi dari kemampuan pemahaman siswa. Arkitektur model QAG yang diusulkan kami diperkenalkan menggunakan set data FairytaleQA yang baru, yang memiliki 278 buku cerita yang ramah dengan anak dengan 10.580 pasangan QA. Evaluasi otomatis dan manusia menunjukkan bahwa model kita melebihi sistem dasar QAG state-of-the-art. Di atas sistem QAG kita, kita juga mulai membangun aplikasi interaktif cerita-cerita untuk penerbangan dunia nyata di masa depan dalam skenario pendidikan ini.', 'fa': 'تکنیک\u200cهای پاسخ سوال (QA) موجود در اصل برای پاسخ از سوال\u200cهایی که از مردم پرسیده\u200cاند، ایجاد می\u200cشوند. اما در کاربردهای آموزشی، معلمان اغلب نیاز دارند که تصمیم بگیرند چه سوالی باید بپرسند، تا به دانش آموزان کمک کنند تا توانایی درک داستان خود را بهبود کند. ما یک سیستم جواب سوال (QAG) را برای این سناریو آموزش طراحی می\u200cکنیم: کتاب داستان در کودکان به سطح هشت درجه به عنوان ورودی، سیستم ما می\u200cتواند به طور خودکار جفت\u200cهای QA را تولید کند که قادر به آزمایش گوناگون اندازه\u200cهای مهارت درک دانشجویی هستند. معماری مدل QAG پیشنهاد ما با استفاده از یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای FairytaleQA نوشته شده متخصص جدید نشان داده می\u200cشود که 278 داستان\u200cهای دوست داشتنی به کودکان با ۱۰.580 QA جفت دارد. ارزیابی\u200cهای خودکار و انسان نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما سیستم\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط QAG را اجرا می\u200cکند. بالای سیستم QAG ما، همچنین شروع به ساختن یک کاربرد داستان\u200cهای متفاوتی برای افزایش دنیای واقعی آینده در این سناریو آموزشی می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Teknolojia za kujibu maswali (QA) zinatengenezwa kwa ujumla ili kujibu maswali yanayoulizwa na binadamu. Lakini katika matumizi ya elimu, walimu mara nyingi wanahitaji kuamua maswali yanayotakiwa kuuliza, ili kuwasaidia wanafunzi kuboresha uwezo wa kuelewa kwa simulizi. Tunaweza kutengeneza mfumo wa kujibu maswali (QAG) kwa ajili ya kipindi hiki cha elimu: kwa kutoa kitabu cha hadithi kutoka kindergarten hadi kiwango cha nane kama kinavyoingizwa, mfumo wetu unaweza kutengeneza ndoa za QA ambazo zinaweza kujaribu tofauti mbalimbali za ujuzi wa elimu wa wanafunzi. Ujengo wetu unapendekezwa wa mifano ya QAG umeonyeshwa kwa kutumia kituo kipya cha taarifa cha kitaalam kinachotangazwa na mashindano ya watoto 278 yenye ndoa 10,580 QA. Tathmini za kujitegemea na binadamu zinaonyesha kwamba mifumo yetu inaonyesha hali ya msingi wa QAG. Kwenye msingi wa mfumo wetu wa QAG, pia tunaanza kujenga maombi yanayosimulia simulizi moja kwa moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya ujasiri wa ulimwengu halisi katika eneo hili la elimu.', 'tr': 'Existing sorag cevaplama teknikleri genellikle insan sorularına cevap vermek için yaratılır. Emma bilim programalarynda mugallymlar köplenç haýsy soraglaryny çözmek üçin, okuwçylara aýdyşy düşünmek ukyplaryny geliştirmek üçin näme soraglaryny çözmeli bolýarlar. Biz bu bilim senaryýasynda otomatik sorag-jogabat döredilmesi (QAG) sistemasyny tasarlaýrys: çagalar bagyndaky hekaýa kitaby 8-nji synpda giriş şeklinde üýtgedip biler, sistemamyz okuwçylaryň düşünmesi ukyplarynyň bir toparyny barlamagy mümkin edip biler. Biziň QAG nusgasymyz bar arhitektura täze uzmançy hasaplanýan FairytaleQA datawatlary ullanýar. Bu 278-nji çaga dosty hekaýa 10,580 QA çift bilen bar. Otomatik we adamlaryň deňlenmeleri biziň nusgamyzyň QAG baseline sistemlerini çykarýandygyny görkezýär. QAG sistemamyzyň üstünde biz hem bu bilim senaryýasynda gelejek dünýäde ýerleşmäge mejbur bir hekaýa aýdyşlygyny gurmaya başladyk.', 'af': "Bestaande vraag antwoord (QA) teknike word grootste gemaak om vrae te antwoord deur mense gevra. Maar in opvoedkundige toepassings moet onderwysers dikwels besluit wat vrae hulle moet vra om studente te help om hul narratiewe verstandige kapasiteite te verbeter. Ons ontwerp 'n outomatiese vraag-antwoord generasie (QAG) stelsel vir hierdie opvoeding scenario: gegee 'n storybok by die kindergarten tot agtste grade vlak a s invoer, ons stelsel kan outomaties genereer QA paar wat is in staat om 'n verskillende dimensies van 'n studente se verstandighede kunstenaars te testen. Ons voorgestelde QAG-model-arkitektuur is deur 'n nuwe eksperteer-annotateerde FairytaleQA-dataset, wat 278 kinders-vriendelike storybooks het met 10,580 QA pare. Outomatiese en menslike evaluasies vertoon dat ons model uitvoer status-of-the-art QAG baseline stelsels. Op die boonste van ons QAG stelsel, begin ons ook om 'n interaktiewe storie vertel toepassing te bou vir die toekomstige reël wêreld verwydering in hierdie opvoedkundige scenario.", 'sq': 'Existing question answering (QA) techniques are created mainly to answer questions asked by humans.  Por në aplikimet arsimore, mësuesit shpesh duhet të vendosin se cilat pyetje duhet të bëjnë, me qëllim që të ndihmojnë studentët të përmirësojnë aftësitë e tyre të kuptimit tregues. Ne dizajnojmë një sistem të automatizuar përgjigje-pyetje (QAG) për këtë skenar arsimor: duke dhënë një libër historish në kopshtin e fëmijëve në klasën e tetë si input, sistemi ynë mund automatikisht të gjenerojë çifte QA që janë në gjendje të testojnë një shumëllojshmëri dimensionesh të aftësive të kuptimit të një studenti. Arkitektura jonë e propozuar e modelit QAG është demonstruar duke përdorur një set të dhënash të ri FairytaleQA të anotuar nga eksperti, i cili ka 278 libra historish miqësore me fëmijë me 10,580 çifte QA. Vlerësimet automatike dhe njerëzore tregojnë se modeli ynë ekziston më së miri në sistemet bazë të QAG. Në krye të sistemit tonë QAG, ne gjithashtu fillojmë të ndërtojmë një aplikim interaktiv tregues historish për vendosjen e ardhshme të botës reale në këtë skenar arsimor.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ጥያቄ መልስ (QA) ቴክክኖችን በመጀመሪያ የሰው ጥያቄዎችን ለመመልስ ይፈጥራል፡፡ ነገር ግን በትምህርት ፕሮግራሞች፣ አስተማሪዎቹ ብዙ ጊዜ ምን ጥያቄ እንዲጠይቁ ያስፈልጋሉ፣ ተማሪዎችን የታሪክ ማስተዋል ስልጣን እንዲያበጅላቸው ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ የዚህን ትምህርት ማዕከላዊ ትውልድ (QAG) ስርዓት ላይ የተለየን የጥያቄ መልስ ትውልድ (የQAG)፤ በኪንበርርጋንት ጀምሮ እስከ ስምንት ደረጃ ደረጃ ድረስ ታሪክ መጽሐፍ ሰጥቷል፡፡ QA dataset, which has 278 child-friendly storybooks with 10,580 QA pairs. አውቶማቲካዊ እና የሰው ማስታወቂያ ምሳሌያችን የQAG መደገፊያ ሲስተም እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡ የQAG ስርዓታችንን በላይ፣ በዚህ ትምህርት ታሪክ ውስጥ ለመቀናኘት እውነተኛ ዓለም ለማስገድ የሚነግረውን የኢትዮጵያ ፕሮግራም መሥራት እንጀምራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող հարցերին պատասխանելու տեխնիկաները հիմնականում ստեղծվում են մարդկանց հարցերին պատասխանելու համար: Բայց կրթական ծրագրերում ուսուցիչները հաճախ պետք է որոշեն, թե ինչ հարցեր պետք է տան, որպեսզի օգնեն ուսանողներին բարելավել իրենց պատմվածքային հասկանալու ունակությունները: Մենք նախագծում ենք այս կրթական սցենարիայի համար մի ավտոմատիկ հարցերի և պատասխանների սերունդ: Երեխաների պարտեզի պատմությունների գիրքը որպես ներմուծք կարող է մեր համակարգը ավտոմատիկ կերպով ստեղծել QA զույգեր, որոնք կարող են ստուգել ուսանողի ընկալության հմտությունների տարբեր չափսեր: Մեր առաջարկված QA Գ մոդելի ճարտարապետությունը ցույց է տալիս օգտագործելով նոր փորձագետ հայտնագրված ՖերիտալեՔԱ տվյալների համակարգ, որը ունի 278 երեխաներին հարմարավետ պատմությունների գրքեր 10,580 QA զույգով: Ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր QAԳ հիմնական համակարգերը: Մեր QAԳ համակարգի վրա մենք նաև սկսում ենք ստեղծել ինտերակտիվ պատմություններ պատմելու ծրագիր ապագայի իրական աշխարհի կիրառման համար այս կրթական սցենարիայում:', 'az': 'Önümüzdeki sual cavab vermək teknikləri insanların soruşduqlarına cavab vermək üçün yaradılır. Lakin təhsil uygulamaları içində müəllimlər çox zaman nə suallarını soruşmalıdırlar ki, öğrencilərə oxuyucu anlama qabiliyyətlərini yaxşılaşdırmağa yardım edək. Biz bu təhsil senaryosu üçün otomatik sual-cavab nəsili (QAG) sistemini tasarlayırıq: uşaqlıq bağının s əkkizinci sınıf dəyişisinə bir hekayə kitabı verilmiş, sistemimiz bir öğrencinin anlaşılma yetkinliklərinin müxtəlif ölçülərini imtahana çəkə bilən QA çift olar. Bizim QAG modeli arhitektüyümüz yeni ekspertlər ilə yazılmış FairytaleQA veri qutusu ilə göstərilmişdir. Buna 278 çocuk dostu hekayələri 10.580 QA çift olan hekayələrdir. Avtomatik və insan değerlendirmələri modellərimizin QAG səviyyəsi sistemlərindən üstün olduğunu göstərir. QAG sistemimizin üstündə də bu təhsil senaryosunda gələcək gerçek dünyada istifadə etmək üçün interaktif hekayə danışma uyğulama başladıq.', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউএ) প্রযুক্তিগুলো মূলত মানুষের প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়ার জন্য তৈরি হয়েছে। কিন্তু শিক্ষাগত অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে শিক্ষার্থীদের প্রায়শই সিদ্ধান্ত নিতে হবে তাদের কি প্রশ্ন জিজ্ঞেস করা উচিত, যাতে ছ আমরা এই শিক্ষা দৃশ্যের জন্য একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রজন্ম (কিউএজি) ব্যবস্থা গঠন করেছি: কিন্দারগার্টেন থেকে আট গ্রেড পর্যন্ত একটি গল্প বই দিয়েছিলাম, যেটা ইনপুট হিসেবে আমাদ আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত কিএজি মডেল কাঠামো প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে নতুন বিশেষজ্ঞ-বিশেষজ্ঞ কিউএ ডাটাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে, যার মধ্যে ২৭৮ জন শিশুর বন্ধুত্বের স্ Automatic and human evaluations show that our model outperforms state-of-the-art QAG baseline systems.  আমাদের কিউএজি সিস্টেমের উপরে আমরা শিক্ষা দৃশ্যের ভবিষ্যতের বাস্তবতার প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য একটি ইন্টারনেকটিভ কাহিনী বলার প্রো', 'ca': "Les tècniques existents de resposta a preguntes (QA) es creen principalment per respondre preguntes fetes pels humans. Però en aplicacions educatives, els professors sovint han de decidir quines preguntes haurien de fer per ajudar els estudiants a millorar les seves capacitats de comprensió narrativa. dissenyem un sistema automatitzat de generació de respostes a preguntes (QAG) per aquest escenari educatiu: dada un llibre d'històries del jardí d'infància a nivell de vuit grau com entrada, el nostre sistema pot generar automàticament parells QA capaços de provar una varietat de dimensions de les habilitats d'comprensió d'un estudiant. La nostra arquitectura del model QAG proposada es demostra utilitzant un nou conjunt de dades FairytaleQA anotat per experts, que té 278 llibres de històries amigables dels nens amb 10.580 parells QA. Les evaluacions automàtiques i humanes mostren que el nostre model supera els sistemes de base de QAG més avançats. On top of our QAG system, we also start to build an interactive story-telling application for the future real-world deployment in this educational scenario.", 'bs': 'Postoje tehnike odgovora na pitanje (QA) stvorene su uglavnom za odgovor na pitanja koje su postavljali ljudi. Međutim, u obrazovnim aplikacijama, učitelji često moraju odlučiti koje pitanja trebaju postaviti, kako bi pomogli studentima da poboljšaju svoje sposobnosti razumijevanja priče. Mi dizajniramo automatski sistem generacije odgovora na pitanje (QAG) za ovaj scenario obrazovanja: s obzirom na knjigu priče u djetinjskoj arteni do osmog razreda kao input, naš sistem može automatski stvoriti par QA koji su sposobni da testiraju razne dimenzije vještina razumijevanja učenika. Naša predložena arhitektura modela QAG pokazuje se koristeći novi komplet podataka FairytaleQA-a, koji ima 278 priče o djetetima sa 10.580 QA parova. Automatske i ljudske procjene pokazuju da naš model iznosi početne sustave stanja umjetnosti QAG-a. Na vrhu našeg QAG sistema, također počinjemo izgraditi interaktivnu priču izjavu za buduću razvoj stvarnog svijeta u ovom obrazovnom scenariju.', 'cs': 'Stávající techniky odpovědi na otázky (QA) jsou vytvořeny zejména pro odpovědi na otázky kladené lidmi. Ve vzdělávacích aplikacích se však učitelé často musí rozhodnout, jaké otázky by měli položit, aby pomohli studentům zlepšit jejich schopnosti narativního porozumění. Pro tento vzdělávací scénář navrhujeme automatický systém generování otázek-odpovědí (QAG): pomocí knihy příběhů v mateřské škole až do osmé třídy jako vstup může náš systém automaticky generovat QA páry, které jsou schopny testovat různé dimenze porozumění studentům. Naše navržená architektura modelu QAG je demonstrována pomocí nové anotované datasady FairytaleQA, která obsahuje 278 příběhové knihy s 10,580 QA páry. Automatická a lidská hodnocení ukazují, že náš model překonává nejmodernější základní systémy QAG. Kromě našeho systému QAG začínáme také vytvářet interaktivní aplikaci pro vyprávění příběhů pro budoucí nasazení v reálném světě v tomto vzdělávacím scénáři.', 'et': 'Olemasolevad küsimustele vastamise tehnikad on loodud peamiselt inimeste esitatud küsimustele vastamiseks. Kuid haridusrakendustes peavad õpetajad sageli otsustama, milliseid küsimusi nad peaksid esitama, et aidata õpilastel parandada oma narratiivset mõistmist. Selle haridusstsenaariumi jaoks kujundame automatiseeritud küsimuste-vastuste genereerimise (QAG) süsteemi: kui lasteaias on sisendina looraamat kaheksandas klassis, saab meie süsteem automaatselt luua kvaliteedi tagamise paare, mis on võimelised testima õpilase arusaamise oskuste erinevaid mõõtmeid. Meie pakutud QAG mudeli arhitektuuri demonstreerimiseks kasutatakse uut ekspertide kommenteeritud FairytaleQA andmekogumit, mis sisaldab 278 lapsesõbralikku juturaamatut 10 580 kvaliteedi tagamise paari. Automaatsed ja inimlikud hindamised näitavad, et meie mudel ületab tipptasemel QAG baassüsteeme. Lisaks meie QAG süsteemile hakkame ehitama interaktiivset lugude jutustamise rakendust tulevaseks reaalseks kasutuselevõtuks selles haridusstsenaariumis.', 'fi': 'Nykyiset kysymyksenvalvontatekniikat (QA) on luotu pääasiassa vastaamaan ihmisten esittämiin kysymyksiin. Mutta opetussovelluksissa opettajien on usein päätettävä, mitä kysymyksiä heidän pitäisi kysyä, jotta oppilaat voivat parantaa kerronnan ymmärtämistä. Suunnittelemme automaattisen kysymys-vastausgeneraation (QAG) järjestelmän tätä koulutusskenaariota varten: kun otetaan huomioon päiväkodin satukirja kahdeksannelle luokalle syötteenä, järjestelmämme voi automaattisesti luoda laadunvarmistuspareja, jotka pystyvät testaamaan erilaisia ulottuvuuksia opiskelijan ymmärtämistaitoja. Ehdotettua QAG-malliarkkitehtuuria esitellään käyttämällä uutta asiantuntija-annotoitua FairytaleQA-aineistoa, jossa on 278 lapsiystävällistä tarinaa, joissa on 10 580 QA-paria. Automaattiset ja inhimilliset arvioinnit osoittavat, että mallimme suoriutuu huippuluokan QAG-perusjärjestelmistä. QAG-järjestelmämme lisäksi alamme rakentaa interaktiivista tarinankerrotussovellusta tulevaisuuden reaalimaailman käyttöönottoon tässä koulutusskenaariossa.', 'jv': 'Rasané pergunian sing bisa gampang (qA) teknik sing nggawe kadaluk urip nggawe ngubah cejane ono sing nganggo barang uwong. Nanging ono aplikasi pituwi, guru-guru kudu supaya supaya sing kudu nggawe kesempatan, bisa supaya supaya awak dhéwé ngéwangi mau. Awak dhéwé, kudu supaya awak dhéwé ngéwangi kapani uwong. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem sistem sing otomatik-ngomong (qARG) kanggo segala winih iki: nyimpen kuwi basa sing nganggo tindakan segala macem sing katêpakan karo sekondiki sing katêpakan tanggal 18: Awak dhéwé Perintah sing paling-perintah sing nêmên Akturaturatura Monday Kita sing wis rampung KARG sistem sing, kita mulai nggawe aplikasi dadi kanggo nggawe barang kanggo ngerayakno perbudhakan kanggo ngerayakno sing rewang iki ning acara awak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Obstoječe tehnike odgovarjanja na vprašanja (QA) so ustvarjene predvsem za odgovore na vprašanja, ki jih postavljajo ljudje. Toda v izobraževalnih aplikacijah se morajo učitelji pogosto odločiti, katera vprašanja naj postavijo, da bi učencem pomagali izboljšati svoje zmožnosti pripovednega razumevanja. Za ta izobraževalni scenarij oblikujemo avtomatiziran sistem generacije vprašanj-odgovorov (QAG): če uporabimo knjigo zgodb v vrtcu do osmega razreda, lahko naš sistem samodejno ustvari pare za zagotavljanje kakovosti, ki so sposobni testirati različne dimenzije študentovih sposobnosti razumevanja. Naša predlagana arhitektura modela QAG je predstavljena z uporabo novega strokovnega nabora podatkov FairytaleQA, ki vsebuje 278 otrokom prijaznih zgodbic z 10.580 parom QA. Avtomatske in človeške ocene kažejo, da naš model presega najsodobnejše osnovne sisteme QAG. Poleg našega sistema QAG začnemo graditi tudi interaktivno aplikacijo za pripovedovanje zgodb za prihodnjo uvajanje realnega sveta v tem izobraževalnem scenariju.', 'bo': 'Existing་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ(QA)ཡི་གེ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་འཛུགས་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། སློབ་ཆེན་གྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ནང་དུ་སྨན་པ་རྒྱུན་དུ་རང་གི་དྲི་བ་གང་འདྲ་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་གྱིས། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཡོན་ལ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་འདྲི་བ་དང་ལན་གསལ་གྱི་མིང་ལམ་ལུགས་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་QAG མ་གཟུགས་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བཀོད་པ་དེ་གསལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྟོན་པའི་ཕྱོགས་གཟུགས་རིས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་མིན་པའི་རྩལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནིའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཕན་འབྲས་བ་ཡོད་པ། ང་ཚོའི་QAG་མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག', 'ha': "QA-metodin wanda ke gaba an halitta shi ne mainli dõmin su karɓa wa tambayar mutum. Amma a a cikin shiryoyin elimu, macallin sun kamata su zãɓi wanne masĩfun su tambayi, dõmin ya taimake ardayan su improve awon fahimtar lãbãri. Tuna ƙayyade wani tsari na tambayar ta farat ɗaya (QAG) wa wannan fasarin education: an a sami wani littãfi a shekarar yargarten zuwa daraja takwas takwas kamar an shiga, na'asarmu yana iya ƙiƙiro nau'in QA da ke iya iya iya jarraba wasu dimiyoyi na danganta na karatun. QA dataset, which has 278 salubbooks of child-Friend with 10,580 QA parfits. Ana iya ƙayyade farat ɗaya da mutum yana nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da halin-of-the-art QAG-system-base. Kayan na tsarin QAG, za'a fara samun mu gina wani applet mai gaya na-lãbãri na guda wa da ake sakar da bakin duniya masu halinsa a gaba ɗaya.", 'he': 'טכניקות עונות על שאלות (QA) קיימות נוצרות בעיקר כדי לענות על שאלות שנשאלות על ידי בני אדם. אבל בתוכניות חינוכיות, המורים לעתים קרובות צריכים להחליט אילו שאלות הם צריכים לשאול, כדי לעזור לתלמידים לשפר את יכולות ההבנה הסיפורית שלהם. אנחנו מעצבים מערכת דור תשובות-שאלות אוטומטית (QAG) לתרחיש החינוך הזה: בהתחשב בספר סיפורים בגן הילדים עד רמה כיתה שמונה כתוצאה, המערכת שלנו יכולה ליצור אוטומטית זוגות QA שיכולות לבדוק מגוון מימדים של כישורי הבנה של תלמיד. ארכיטקטורת מודל QAG המוצעת שלנו מוצגת באמצעות קבוצת מידע FairytaleQA חדשה שמוצגת מומחה, שיש לה 278 ספרים סיפורים ידידותיים לילדים עם 10,580 זוגות QA. הערכות אוטומטיות ואנושיות מראות שהמודל שלנו עולה על מערכות ראשיות QAG מצוינות. בנוסף למערכת QAG שלנו, אנחנו גם מתחילים לבנות יישום אינטראקטיבי לסיפור סיפורים עבור השימוש בעולם האמיתי העתיד בתרחיש החינוך הזה.'}
{'en': 'Dataset Geography Mapping Language Data to Language Users', 'fr': "Découverte de règles basées sur des invites et renforcement pour l'apprentissage interactif faiblement supervisé", 'ar': 'اكتشاف القواعد المستندة إلى السرعة وتعزيز التعلم التفاعلي الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف', 'es': 'Descubrimiento de reglas basado en prontitud e impulso para el aprendizaje interactivo débilmente supervisado', 'pt': 'Descoberta e reforço de regras baseadas em prompt para aprendizado interativo fracamente supervisionado', 'zh': '基于提格见擢,以交互式弱督学', 'ru': 'Быстрое обнаружение и усиление правил для интерактивного обучения под слабым контролем', 'hi': 'प्रॉम्प्ट-आधारित नियम डिस्कवरी और इंटरैक्टिव कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के लिए बूस्टिंग', 'ja': 'インタラクティブな弱監督型学習のためのプロンプトベースルールの発見とブースト', 'ga': 'Riail Pras-Bhunaithe a Fhionnachtain agus Treisiú don Fhoghlaim Idirghníomhach Lag-Maoirsithe', 'el': 'Άμεση ανακάλυψη κανόνων και ενίσχυση για διαδραστική αδύναμη εποπτευόμενη μάθηση', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Azonnali alapú szabályok felfedezése és erősítése az interaktív gyengén felügyelt tanuláshoz', 'kk': 'Негізгі ережелерді қарастыру және интерактивті күнделікті бақылау үшін көмектесу', 'lt': 'Skubiai pagrįstos taisyklės atradimas ir aktyvaus silpnai prižiūrimo mokymosi skatinimas', 'it': "Scoperta e potenziamento delle regole basate su prompt per l'apprendimento interattivo debolmente supervisionato", 'mk': 'Prompt-Based Rule Discovery and Boosting for Interactive Weakly-Supervised Learning', 'ms': 'Penyelidikan dan Membentuk Peraturan Berasas-Prompt untuk Pempelajaran Terawas-Mudah Interaktif', 'ml': 'Prompt-Based Rule Discovery and Boosting for Interactive Weakly-Supervised Learning', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta u t-tisħiħ ta’ Regoli bbażati fuq il-pront għal Tagħlim Interattiv b’Superviżjoni dgħajfa', 'mn': 'Интерактив хүчтэй хамгийн баталгаатай суралцахын тулд', 'no': 'Spørtbasert regel- oppdaging og oppretting for interaktiv vektbasert læring', 'pl': 'Szybkie wykrywanie reguł i wspieranie interaktywnego uczenia się słabo nadzorowanego', 'ro': 'Descoperirea și stimularea regulilor bazate pe prompt pentru învățarea interactivă slab supravegheată', 'sr': 'Prometeno osnovno otkrivanje pravila i poticanje interaktivnog osnovnog učenja', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Ku baaraandegista sharciga aasaasiga ah', 'ta': 'செயற்படுத்தப்பட்ட வான்க்காலத்திற்கான அடிப்படையான விதிமுறை கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் புதுப்பி', 'ur': 'پیغام-بنیاد قانون ڈیسکونٹی اور انٹراکسٹیو کم-نازل کی سیکھنے کے لئے زیادتی', 'sv': 'Snabbbaserad regelsökning och förstärkning för interaktivt svagt övervakat lärande', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Khởi động nút giảm án và nâng đỡ cho học vấn tương tác,', 'bg': 'Откриване и насърчаване на правилата за интерактивно слабо контролирано обучение', 'hr': 'Potražiti otkrivanje pravila i poticanje interaktivnog slabo nadziranog učenja', 'da': 'Hurtigbaseret regelopdagelse og styrkelse for interaktiv svagt overvåget læring', 'nl': 'Snelle regelontdekking en boosting voor interactief leren onder zwak toezicht', 'de': 'Prompt-Based Rule Discovery und Boosting für interaktives schwach überwachtes Lernen', 'id': 'Penemuan dan Peningkatan Peraturan Berdasarkan Prompt untuk Pempelajaran Interaktif yang Terwaspada Dengan Lemah', 'ko': '상호작용식 약한 감독 학습에서 제시된 규칙에 기초한 발견과 강화', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن قانون پایه\u200cی پرداخت و تحویل یادگیری\u200cهای ضعیف تحت تاثیر', 'sw': 'Prompt-Based Rule Discovery and Boosting for Interactive Weakly-Supervised Learning', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Interactive Weather-Supervised Learning For Interactive Weather-Supervised Learning', 'sq': 'Zbulimi dhe nxitja e rregullave të bazuara në mënyrë të shpejtë për mësimin interaktiv me mbikqyrje të dobët', 'hy': 'Խնդիրում հիմնված կանոնների բացահայտումը և խրախուսելը ինտերակտիվ թույլ-վերահսկված սովորելու համար', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'ইন্টার্টিভেট উইক্লি- সাপার্ভিস শিক্ষার জন্য প্রোম্প- ভিত্তিক নিয়ম ডিসারি এবং বুস্টিং', 'az': 'İnterактив zəiflik-gözləyirli Öyrənmək üçün Öyrənmək və İnterактив Qurululu Öyrənmək', 'ca': "Descobrir i impulsar les regles promptes per a l'aprenentatge interactiu amb deficiència supervisada", 'bs': 'Pomoćno otkrivanje pravila i poticanje interaktivnog slabo nadziranog učenja', 'et': 'Kiirpõhine reeglite avastamine ja interaktiivse nõrgalt järelevalvega õppimise edendamine', 'cs': 'Rychlé zjišťování a podpora pravidel pro interaktivní učení se slabým dohledem', 'fi': 'Nopea sääntöjen löytäminen ja tehostaminen vuorovaikutteisesti heikosti valvottuun oppimiseen', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje in spodbujanje pravil za interaktivno šibko nadzorovano učenje', 'he': 'גילוי חוקים מבוססים בקרוב ומעדכון ללימודים אינטראקטיביים עם שליטה חלשה', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Interactive Weakly-Supervised Learning(Interactive Weakly-Supervised Learning)ཡི་བརྗོད་ལ་འཕགས་རིས་གཞི་རྟེན་གཞི་བཙུགས་སྟངས་དང་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'As language technologies become more ubiquitous there are increasing efforts towards expanding the language diversity and coverage of natural language processing NLP systems Arguably the most important factor influencing the quality of modern NLP systems is data availability In this work we study the geographical representativeness of NLP datasets aiming to quantify if and by how much do NLP datasets match the expected needs of the language speakers In doing so we use entity recognition and linking systems also making important observations about their cross lingual consistency and giving suggestions for more robust evaluation Last we explore some geographical and economic factors that may explain the observed dataset distributions', 'pt': 'O aprendizado fracamente supervisionado (WSL) mostrou resultados promissores no tratamento da escassez de rótulos em muitas tarefas de PNL, mas projetar manualmente um conjunto de regras de rotulagem abrangente e de alta qualidade é tedioso e difícil. Estudamos o aprendizado interativo fracamente supervisionado --- o problema de descobrir de forma iterativa e automática novas regras de rotulagem a partir de dados para melhorar o modelo WSL. Nosso modelo proposto, chamado PRBoost, atinge esse objetivo por meio de descoberta de regras iterativas baseadas em prompt e reforço de modelo. Ele usa a otimização para identificar instâncias de erros grandes e descobre regras candidatas a partir delas, solicitando LMs pré-treinados com modelos de regras. As regras candidatas são julgadas por especialistas humanos e as regras aceitas são usadas para gerar rótulos fracos complementares e fortalecer o modelo atual. Experimentos em quatro tarefas mostram que o PRBoost supera as linhas de base WSL de última geração em até US$ 7,1\\%$ e preenche as lacunas com modelos totalmente supervisionados.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage faiblement supervisé (WSL) a donné des résultats prometteurs pour remédier à la pénurie d'étiquettes pour de nombreuses tâches de PNL, mais la conception manuelle d'un ensemble complet de règles d'étiquetage de haute qualité est fastidieuse et difficile. Nous étudions l'apprentissage interactif faiblement supervisé, c'est-à-dire le problème de la découverte itérative et automatique de nouvelles règles d'étiquetage à partir de données afin d'améliorer le modèle WSL. Le modèle que nous proposons, baptisé PRBoost, atteint cet objectif grâce à la découverte itérative des règles basée sur des invites et à l'optimisation du modèle. Il utilise le renforcement pour identifier les instances à erreur importante et découvre les règles candidates à partir de celles-ci en invitant les LM pré-entraînés avec des modèles de règles. Les règles des candidats sont jugées par des experts humains, et les règles acceptées sont utilisées pour générer des labels faibles complémentaires et renforcer le modèle actuel. Des expériences sur quatre tâches montrent que PRBoost surpasse les lignes de base WSL de pointe jusqu'à 7,1$\xa0\\ %$, et comble les lacunes grâce à des modèles entièrement supervisés.", 'es': 'El aprendizaje supervisado débilmente (WSL) ha mostrado resultados prometedores al abordar la escasez de etiquetas en muchas tareas de PNL, pero diseñar manualmente un conjunto de reglas de etiquetado integral y de alta calidad es tedioso y difícil. Estudiamos el aprendizaje interactivo débilmente supervisado, el problema de descubrir de forma iterativa y automática reglas de etiquetado novedosas a partir de los datos para mejorar el modelo WSL. Nuestro modelo propuesto, denominado PRBoost, logra este objetivo mediante el descubrimiento iterativo de reglas basado en solicitudes y la potenciación del modelo. Utiliza el impulso para identificar instancias de errores grandes y descubre reglas candidatas a partir de ellas mediante la solicitud de LM previamente entrenados con plantillas de reglas. Las reglas de los candidatos son juzgadas por expertos humanos, y las reglas aceptadas se utilizan para generar etiquetas débiles complementarias y fortalecer el modelo actual. Los experimentos en cuatro tareas muestran que PRBoost supera a las líneas base WSL de última generación hasta $7.1\\ %$ y cierra las brechas con modelos totalmente supervisados.', 'hi': 'कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित सीखने (डब्ल्यूएसएल) ने कई एनएलपी कार्यों पर लेबल की कमी को संबोधित करने में आशाजनक परिणाम दिखाए हैं, लेकिन मैन्युअल रूप से एक व्यापक, उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले लेबलिंग नियम सेट को डिजाइन करना थकाऊ और मुश्किल है। हम इंटरैक्टिव कमजोर रूप से पर्यवेक्षित सीखने का अध्ययन करते हैं--- पुनरावृत्ति की समस्या और स्वचालित रूप से डब्ल्यूएसएल मॉडल को बेहतर बनाने के लिए डेटा से उपन्यास लेबलिंग नियमों की खोज करते हैं। हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल, PRBoost नाम, पुनरावर्ती प्रॉम्प्ट-आधारित नियम खोज और मॉडल बूस्टिंग के माध्यम से इस लक्ष्य को प्राप्त करता है। यह बड़े-त्रुटि उदाहरणों की पहचान करने के लिए बूस्टिंग का उपयोग करता है और नियम टेम्पलेट्स के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एलएम को संकेत देकर उनसे उम्मीदवार नियमों की खोज करता है। उम्मीदवार नियमों को मानव विशेषज्ञों द्वारा आंका जाता है, और स्वीकृत नियमों का उपयोग पूरक कमजोर लेबल उत्पन्न करने और वर्तमान मॉडल को मजबूत करने के लिए किया जाता है। चार कार्यों पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि PRBoost $ 7.1 \\ % $ तक अत्याधुनिक WSL बेसलाइन को मात देता है, और पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल के साथ अंतराल को पुल करता है।', 'ar': 'أظهر التعلم الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف (WSL) نتائج واعدة في معالجة ندرة التسمية في العديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، لكن التصميم اليدوي لمجموعة قواعد وضع العلامات الشاملة عالية الجودة أمر ممل وصعب. ندرس التعلم التفاعلي الخاضع للإشراف الضعيف - مشكلة الاكتشاف المتكرر والتلقائي لقواعد وضع العلامات الجديدة من البيانات لتحسين نموذج WSL. يحقق نموذجنا المقترح ، المسمى PRBoost ، هذا الهدف من خلال اكتشاف القواعد الفوري التكراري وتعزيز النموذج. يستخدم التعزيز لتحديد حالات الخطأ الكبير واكتشاف القواعد المرشحة منها عن طريق مطالبة LMs المدربة مسبقًا بقوالب القواعد. يتم الحكم على القواعد المرشحة من قبل خبراء بشريين ، ويتم استخدام القواعد المقبولة لإنشاء تسميات ضعيفة تكميلية وتقوية النموذج الحالي. تُظهر التجارب على أربع مهام أن PRBoost يتفوق في الأداء على أحدث خطوط أساس WSL حتى $ 7.1 \\٪ $ ، ويسد الفجوات بنماذج خاضعة للإشراف الكامل.', 'zh': '弱督学(WSL)多NLP务者稀缺性见其所欲,然手动设一周高质量集是乏味难也。 臣等考交互式弱督学---迭代、自见于数,以进WSL法。 吾所谓 PRBoost 者迭代以象之。 其用升以识大谬,并示有则模板预训练之 LM 以见选法。 选法出于人伦,用公法生互补弱标签,强化于时。 四任之实验,PRBoost善先进之WSL基线,至高至7.1\\%$,而尽监之模弥合。', 'ja': '弱い監督下での学習（ WSL ）は、多くのNLPタスクのラベル不足に対処する上で有望な結果を示しているが、包括的で高品質なラベル付けルールセットを手動で設計することは面倒で難しい。私たちは、インタラクティブな弱監督学習を研究しています。これは、WSLモデルを改善するために、データから新規のラベル付けルールを反復的に自動的に発見する問題です。PRBoostと名付けられた当社の提案モデルは、反復プロンプトベースのルール発見とモデルブーストによってこの目標を達成します。ブースティングを使用して大きなエラーインスタンスを特定し、事前にトレーニングを受けたLMにルールテンプレートを提示することで、それらから候補ルールを発見します。候補規則は人間の専門家によって判断され、承認された規則は補完的な弱いラベルを生成し、現在のモデルを強化するために使用されます。4つのタスクの実験では、PRBoostは最先端のWSLベースラインを最大$ 7.1 \\%$まで上回り、完全に監督されたモデルでギャップを埋めます。', 'ru': 'Обучение под слабым контролем (WSL) показало многообещающие результаты в решении проблемы дефицита меток для многих задач NLP, но разработка вручную всеобъемлющего набора правил маркировки высокого качества является утомительной и трудной задачей. Мы изучаем интерактивное слабо контролируемое обучение - проблему итерационного и автоматического обнаружения новых правил маркировки из данных для улучшения модели WSL. Наша предлагаемая модель, названная PRBoost, достигает этой цели посредством итеративного быстрого обнаружения правил и повышения эффективности модели. Он использует ускорение для выявления крупных экземпляров ошибок и обнаруживает правила-кандидаты из них, предлагая предварительно обученные LM с шаблонами правил. Правила-кандидаты оцениваются экспертами-человеками, а принятые правила используются для создания взаимодополняющих слабых ярлыков и укрепления существующей модели. Эксперименты по четырем задачам показывают, что PRBoost превосходит современные базовые линии WSL до 7,1 $\\%$ и устраняет пробелы с помощью полностью контролируемых моделей.', 'ga': 'Tá torthaí geallta ag foghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht lag (WSL) maidir le dul i ngleic le ganntanas lipéad ar go leor tascanna NLP, ach tá sé deacair agus deacair tacar rialacha lipéadaithe cuimsitheach ardcháilíochta a dhearadh de láimh. Déanaimid staidéar ar fhoghlaim idirghníomhach faoi mhaoirseacht lag --- an fhadhb a bhaineann le rialacha núíosacha lipéadaithe a fháil amach go atriallach agus go huathoibríoch ó shonraí chun an tsamhail WSL a fheabhsú. Baintear an sprioc seo amach inár múnla molta, darb ainm PRBoost, trí fhionnachtain phras-bhunaithe rialacha atriallach agus trí mhúnla a threisiú. Úsáideann sé treisiú chun cásanna mórearráide a aithint agus aimsíonn sé rialacha iarrthóra uathu trí LManna réamhoilte a spreagadh le teimpléid rialacha. Déanann saineolaithe daonna na rialacha iarrthóra a mheas, agus úsáidtear na rialacha a nglactar leo chun lipéid laga comhlántacha a ghiniúint agus chun an tsamhail reatha a neartú. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar cheithre thasc go n-éiríonn le PRBoost na bunlínte WSL úrscothacha suas go $7.1\\%$, agus líonann sé na bearnaí le samhlacha lánmhaoirsithe.', 'el': 'Η αδύναμη εποπτευόμενη μάθηση έχει δείξει πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα στην αντιμετώπιση της έλλειψης ετικετών σε πολλές εργασίες αλλά ο χειροκίνητος σχεδιασμός ενός ολοκληρωμένου, υψηλής ποιότητας συνόλου κανόνων σήμανσης είναι κουραστικός και δύσκολος. Μελετάμε τη διαδραστική αδύναμα-εποπτευόμενη μάθηση-το πρόβλημα της επαναλαμβανόμενης και αυτόματα ανακάλυψης νέων κανόνων μαρκαρίσματος από τα δεδομένα για τη βελτίωση του μοντέλου. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο, το οποίο ονομάζεται επιτυγχάνει αυτόν τον στόχο μέσω επαναλαμβανόμενης ανακάλυψης κανόνων βάσει προτροπής και ενίσχυσης μοντέλου. Χρησιμοποιεί ενίσχυση για τον εντοπισμό περιπτώσεων μεγάλου σφάλματος και ανακαλύπτει υποψήφιους κανόνες από αυτούς, ζητώντας προ-εκπαιδευμένα LM με πρότυπα κανόνων. Οι υποψήφιοι κανόνες κρίνονται από ανθρώπινους εμπειρογνώμονες και οι αποδεκτοί κανόνες χρησιμοποιούνται για τη δημιουργία συμπληρωματικών αδύναμων ετικετών και την ενίσχυση του τρέχοντος μοντέλου. Τα πειράματα σε τέσσερις εργασίες δείχνουν ότι το PRBoost ξεπερνά τις τελευταίες γραμμές βάσης μέχρι $7.1\\%$καιγεφυρώνει τα κενά με πλήρως εποπτευμένα μοντέλα.', 'it': "L'apprendimento debolmente supervisionato (WSL) ha mostrato risultati promettenti nell'affrontare la scarsità di etichette in molte attività NLP, ma progettare manualmente un set completo di regole di etichettatura di alta qualità è noioso e difficile. Studiamo l'apprendimento interattivo debolmente supervisionato --- il problema della scoperta iterativa e automatica di nuove regole di etichettatura dai dati per migliorare il modello WSL. Il nostro modello proposto, denominato PRBoost, raggiunge questo obiettivo attraverso la scoperta iterativa di regole basate su prompt e il potenziamento del modello. Utilizza il potenziamento per identificare le istanze di grandi errori e scoprire le regole candidate da esse richiedendo LM pre-addestrati con modelli di regole. Le regole dei candidati sono giudicate da esperti umani e le regole accettate sono utilizzate per generare etichette deboli complementari e rafforzare il modello attuale. Esperimenti su quattro attività mostrano che PRBoost supera le linee di base WSL all'avanguardia fino a $7,1\\%$, e colma le lacune con modelli completamente supervisionati.", 'lt': 'Weakly-supervised learning (WSL) has shown promising results in addressing label scarcity on many NLP tasks, but manually designing a comprehensive, high-quality labeling rule set is tedious and difficult.  Mes tiriame interaktyvų silpnai prižiūrimą mokymąsi, problem ą, susijusią su pakartotiniu ir automatiniu naujų ženklinimo taisyklių atradimu iš duomenų siekiant pagerinti WSL model į. Mūsų siūlomas modelis, pavadintas PRBoost, šį tikslą pasiekia kartotiniu greitu taisyklių atradimu ir modelio stiprinimu. Jame naudojamas skatinimas nustatyti didelių klaidų atvejus ir iš jų nustatomos kandidatų taisyklės, skatinant iš anksto apmokytas LM su taisyklių šablonais. Taisykles kandidatėms vertina žmogaus ekspertai, o priimtos taisyklės naudojamos papildomoms silpnoms etiketėms sukurti ir dabartiniam modeliui stiprinti. Eksperimentai keturiose užduotyse parodė, kad PRBoost rezultatai yra aukščiausios pažangos WSL bazinės linijos iki 7,1 proc. dolerių, o atotrūkis užpildomas visapusiškai prižiūrimi modeliais.', 'kk': 'Кейбір NLP тапсырмаларында белгілер қажеттілігін бақылау (WSL) деген көпшілікті оқытуды көрсетеді, бірақ қолмен толық, жоғары сапатты жарлықтау ережелерін жасау ережесі қиын және қиын. Біз интерактивті бақылайтын оқытуды зерттейміз - қайталап және автоматты түрде деректерден жарлық ережелерді ашу үшін WSL моделін жақсарту үшін романдық ережелерді табу мәселесі. Біздің PRBoost деп аталатын үлгіміз бұл мақсатты қайталау үлгілерді табу мен үлгілерді көтеру арқылы жеткізеді. Бұл үлкен қатенің инстанцияларын анықтау үшін қолданылады және олардан кандидатты ережелерді ережелер үлгілерімен алдындағы LMs- лерді сұрау үшін анықтайды. Кандидаттар ережелері адамдардың эксперттері шешілді, қабылданған ережелерді қосымша жарлық жарлықтарды құру үшін жұмыс істеу үшін қолданылады. Төрт тапсырмалардың тәжірибелері PRBoost- тың күй- жайындағы WSL негізгі сызықтарын $7.1\\%$ деп көрсетеді, және толық қарау үлгілерімен бос орындарды көшірмеледі.', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran yang mengawasi lemah (WSL) telah menunjukkan keputusan yang berjanji dalam mengatasi kekurangan label pada banyak tugas NLP, tetapi secara manual merancang peraturan label yang meliputi, kualiti tinggi ditetapkan adalah membosankan dan sukar. Kami mempelajari pembelajaran interaktif yang mengawasi kelemahan-- masalah penemuan secara berulang-ulang dan secara automatik peraturan label novel dari data untuk meningkatkan model WSL. Model kami yang diusulkan, bernama PRBoost, mencapai tujuan ini melalui penemuan peraturan yang berdasarkan prompt berulang ulang dan meningkatkan model. Ia menggunakan penolakan untuk mengenalpasti kes ralat-besar dan menemukan peraturan calon dari mereka dengan meminta LMs terlatih awal dengan templat peraturan. Peraturan calon dihukum oleh ahli manusia, dan peraturan yang diterima digunakan untuk menghasilkan label lemah komplementari dan kuatkan model semasa. Eksperimen pada empat tugas menunjukkan PRBoost melampaui baris dasar WSL-state-of-the-art sehingga $7.1\\%$, dan menyambung kosong dengan model yang diawasi sepenuhnya.', 'hu': 'A gyengén felügyelt tanulás (WSL) ígéretes eredményeket mutatott a címkehiány kezelésében számos NLP feladat esetében, de egy átfogó, kiváló minőségű címkézési szabálykészlet manuális kialakítása unalmas és nehéz. Az interaktív, gyengén felügyelt tanulást tanulmányozzuk -- az új címkézési szabályok iteratív és automatikus felfedezésének problémáját az adatokból a WSL modell javítása érdekében. A PRBoost nevű javasolt modellünk iteratív prompt-alapú szabálykereséssel és modelljavítással éri el ezt a célt. A javítás segítségével azonosíthatja a nagy hibákat okozó példányokat, és felfedezi azokból a jelölt szabályokat azáltal, hogy előre képzett LM-eket kér szabálysablonokkal. A jelöltek szabályait emberi szakértők ítélik meg, az elfogadott szabályokat pedig a kiegészítő gyenge címkék létrehozására és a jelenlegi modell megerősítésére használják. A négy feladaton végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a PRBoost túllépi a legkorszerűbb WSL alapkövetelményeket akár $7,1\\%$-ig, és áthidalja a réseket teljes mértékben felügyelt modellekkel.', 'mk': 'Слабо надгледуваното учење (WSL) покажа ветувачки резултати во решавањето на недостатокот на етикетите на многу NLP задачи, но рачно дизајнирањето на сеопфатно, висококвалитетно правило за етикетирање е досадно и тешко. We study interactive weakly-supervised learning---the problem of iteratively and automatically discovering novel labeling rules from data to improve the WSL model.  Нашиот предложен модел, наречен PRBoost, ја постигнува оваа цел преку итно откривање на правила и зајакнување на моделот. Истиот користи зајакнување за идентификување на големи грешки и ги открива кандидатските правила од нив со поттикнување на предобучени ЛМ со правила шаблони. Кандидатските правила се проценуваат од човечки експерти, а прифатените правила се користат за генерирање комплементарни слаби етикети и зајакнување на сегашниот модел. Експериментите на четири задачи покажуваат дека PRBoost ги надминува најсовремените основни линии на WSL до 7,1 отсто американски долари и ги преместува празнините со целосно надгледувани модели.', 'ka': 'უბრალოდ მონაცემებული სწავლება (WSL) გამოჩვენეთ გასაკეთებელი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომელიც ბევრი NLP დავალებების შესახებ, მაგრამ მანძილურად განაზღვრება ყველაფერი, უფრო კარგალიტიური eti ჩვენ ინტერრაქტიურად დავიწყებთ სწავლების ინტერრაქტიურად დავიწყებთ, რომელიც ინტერრაქტიურად და ავტომატურად აღმოჩენა პრომენტების მართლის წესები მონაცემების გან ჩვენი პროგრამის მოდელი, რომელიც სახელი PRBoost, მიიღება ეს მიზეზი იტრატიურად მუშაობით განახლება და მოდელის მოქმედება. ის გამოყენება დიდი შეცდომა ინსტენსტის განსაზღვრებისთვის და მათგანგან კანდიდენტის წესების განსაზღვრებისთვის, მაშინ წესების განსაზღვრებისთვის პროგრამეტრების კანდიდენტების წესები ადამიანის ექსპერტებით გადაწყვეტილება, და მიღებული წესები გამოყენება კომპლემენტური შილა ნიშანების შექმნა და მიმდინარე მოდელს ფარჯერ დავალების ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს PRBoost-ს გასაკეთებელი WSL-ის ბაზლინტები 7,1\\%$, და აკეთებს განსხვავებას ყველაფერად დანახვა მოდელებით.', 'mt': "It-tagħlim b’superviżjoni dgħajfa (WSL) wera riżultati promettenti fl-indirizzar tal-iskarsezza tat-tikketta fuq ħafna kompiti NLP, iżda d-disinn manwali ta’ regola komprensiva ta’ tikkettar ta’ kwalità għolja huwa tedjuż u diffiċli. Aħna nistudjaw tagħlim interattiv b'superviżjoni dgħajfa-- il-problema ta' skoperta b'mod iterattiv u awtomatiku ta' regoli ġodda ta' tikkettar mid-dejta biex jittejjeb il-mudell WSL. Il-mudell propost tagħna, imsejjaħ PRBoost, jilħaq dan l-għan permezz ta’ skoperta repetuta u rapida tar-regoli u tisħiħ tal-mudell. Hija tuża spinta biex tidentifika każijiet ta’ żbalji kbar u tiskopri regoli kandidati minnhom billi tippromwovi LMs imħarrġa minn qabel b’mudelli ta’ regoli. Ir-regoli kandidati huma ġġudikati minn esperti umani, u r-regoli aċċettati jintużaw biex jiġġeneraw tikketti dgħajfa kumplimentari u jsaħħu l-mudell attwali. L-esperimenti fuq erba’ kompiti juru li PRBoost għandu prestazzjonijiet ogħla mil-linji bażi tal-aħħar WSL sa $7.1\\%$, u jgħaqqad id-distakki ma’ mudelli sorveljati bis-sħiħ.", 'ml': 'കുറഞ്ഞ നിരീക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭ്യാസം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പലത് NLP ജോലികളിലുള്ള ലേബറ്റിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യുഎസ്\u200cഎല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വേണ്ടി വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള നോവല്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d, പ്രിബൂസ്റ്റ് എന്ന പേര്, ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമായ വേഗം അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നിയമം കണ വലിയ പിശകുകളുടെ അവസ്ഥ തിരിച്ചറിയാനും അവയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന നിയമം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനും ബുസ്റ്റിങ്ങ് ഉപയോഗിക്ക പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിശേഷികളാല്\u200d വിധിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. സ്വീകരിക്കപ്പെട്ട നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d ക്രമമാ നാല് ജോലികളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രിബൂസ്റ്റ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓപ്പ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ട്. വിസ്താരത്തിന്റെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഡോളറുകള്\u200d 7. 1$വരെ പ്രവര', 'mn': 'Олон NLP даалгаварын талаар хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн суралцах (WSL) нь олон NLP даалгаварын талаар хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөхөд амлалтай үр дүнг харуулсан. Гэхдээ гараараа хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн, өндөр чанартай тэмдэглэх дүр Бид энерактив бага зэрэг удирдлагатай сургалтыг судалж, давтагдсан, автоматаар өгөгдлийн шинэ загвар нээж, WSL загварыг сайжруулахын тулд шинэ шинэ загварын асуудал юм. Бидний PRBoost нэртэй санал өгсөн загварын загвар нь энэ зорилго дахин давтагдсан хууль нээлттэй, загвар нэмэгдүүлэхээр гарч ирнэ. Энэ нь маш том алдаа гаргасан тохиолдолуудыг тодорхойлж, тэднээс алдаа боловсруулагдсан LMs-г хууль шалгалтын шалгалтыг шалгаж олдог. Хувьсгалтын хууль нь хүн төрөлхтний мэргэжилтнүүд шүүмжлэгддэг. Хувьсгалтын хууль нь нэмэлт сул загваруудыг бий болгож, одоогийн загварыг укреплахын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Дөрвөн даалгаварын туршилт нь PRBoost-ын урлагийн үндсэн WSL суурь шугамнуудыг 7.1$ хүртэл үзүүлдэг. Тэгээд тэдгээр заагуудыг бүрэн удирдлагатай загвартай холбоотой.', 'pl': 'Słabo nadzorowane uczenie się (WSL) wykazało obiecujące rezultaty w rozwiązywaniu niedoboru etykiet w wielu zadaniach NLP, ale ręczne projektowanie kompleksowego, wysokiej jakości zestawu reguł etykietowania jest żmudne i trudne. Badamy interaktywne uczenie się słabo nadzorowane---problem iteracyjnego i automatycznego odkrywania nowych reguł etykietowania z danych w celu ulepszenia modelu WSL. Nasz proponowany model o nazwie PRBoost osiąga ten cel dzięki iteracyjnemu wykrywaniu reguł opartemu na szybkim wykrywaniu i zwiększaniu modelu. Wykorzystuje Boosting do identyfikacji wystąpień dużych błędów i wykrywa reguły kandydatów z nich poprzez zapytanie wstępnie przeszkolonych LM ze szablonami reguł. Zasady kandydujące są oceniane przez ekspertów ludzkich, a przyjęte zasady są wykorzystywane do generowania uzupełniających się słabych etykiet i wzmocnienia obecnego modelu. Eksperymenty na czterech zadaniach pokazują, że PRBoost przewyższa najnowocześniejsze linie bazowe WSL do $7.1\\%$iwypełnia luki za pomocą w pełni nadzorowanych modeli.', 'ro': 'Învățarea slab supravegheată (WSL) a arătat rezultate promițătoare în abordarea deficitului de etichete în multe sarcini PNL, dar proiectarea manuală a unui set cuprinzător de reguli de etichetare de înaltă calitate este plictisitoare și dificilă. Studiem învățarea interactivă slab supravegheată --- problema descoperirii iterative și automate a regulilor noi de etichetare din date pentru a îmbunătăți modelul WSL. Modelul nostru propus, numit PRBoost, atinge acest obiectiv prin descoperirea de reguli iterative bazate pe prompt și stimularea modelului. Utilizează îmbunătățirea pentru a identifica instanțele de erori mari și descoperă regulile candidate de la ele, solicitând LM-uri pre-instruite cu șabloane de reguli. Regulile candidatului sunt evaluate de experți umani, iar regulile acceptate sunt utilizate pentru a genera etichete slabe complementare și pentru a consolida modelul actual. Experimentele efectuate pe patru sarcini arată că PRBoost depășește performanțele de bază WSL de ultimă generație de până la 7,1\\%$, și compensează golurile cu modele complet supravegheate.', 'no': 'Kvart overvåking av læring (WSL) har vist promiserende resultat i å adressera merkelappen for mange NLP- oppgåver, men å designera ei komplett, høg kvalitetmerkelapp- regel sett manuelt er tydelig og vanskeleg. Vi studerer interaktivt vekk overvåka læring -- problemet med gjentakelig og automatisk oppdaging av novelmerkelige reglar frå data for å forbetra WSL-modellen. Vår foreslått modell, namnet PRBoost, oppnår dette målet ved å oppdaga reteringsprompt-basert regel og oppdaga modell. Det bruker å oppdaga store feilinstansar og oppdaga kandidatreglar frå dei ved å spørja etter føretrenga LMs med regelmalar. Kandidate-reglane vert retta av menneskelige ekspertar, og dei godtekne reglane vert brukte for å laga komplementære svake etikettar og styrke den gjeldande modellen. Eksperimentar på fire oppgåver viser at PRBoost utfører tilstanden av kunsten WSL baselinjer opp til $7.1\\%, og bryter mellomroma med fullstendig oversikt av modeller.', 'sr': 'Teško nadzirano učenje (WSL) pokazalo je obećavajuće rezultate u rješavanju nedostatka etiketa na mnogim zadacima NLP-a, ali je ručno dizajniranje sveobuhvatnog, visokokvalitetnog pravila za etiketiranje dosadno i teško. Proučavamo interaktivno slabo nadzirano učenje -- problema iterativnog i automatskog otkrivanja pravila o etiketi novca iz podataka kako bi poboljšali model WSL-a. Naš predloženi model, po imenu PRBoost, postiže ovaj cilj putem otkrivanja pravila i pojačanja modela na iterativnoj brzini. Koristi jačanje za identifikaciju velikih pogrešnih slučajeva i otkrivanje pravila kandidata od njih potaknutim predobučenim LMs sa pravilnim šablovima. Pravila kandidata osuđuju ljudski stručnjaci, a prihvaćena pravila se koristi za stvaranje komplementnih slabi etiketi i jačanje trenutnog modela. Eksperimenti na četiri zadatke pokazuju da PRBoost iznosi osnovne linije u stanju umjetnosti WSL-a do 7,1$ i prebacuje praznine sa potpuno nadzirenim modelima.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada aad u ilaalinaysan (WSL) waxay tustay resultooyin ballanqaadsan oo ku saabsan baaraandegista calaamadda ee shaqooyinka badan ee NLP, laakiin si rasmi ah ayaa loo qoray qaynuunka qorsheynta qoraalka ah oo hoos u dhiganaya oo aad u adag. Waxbarashada iskuulaadka si tabar yar oo la ilaaliyo---dhibaatada si rasmi ah iyo si automati ah ayaannu ka baranaynaa sharciyada qoraalka qoraalka ee macluumaadka si loo hagaajiyo modelka WSL. Tusaale la soo jeeday ee la yidhaahdo PRBoost, wuxuu goalkan ku dhamaadaa baaritaanka sharciga degdeg ah iyo boostinga model. Waxay isticmaaltaa boosashada si uu u ogaado dhacdooyinka qaladka badan iyo in uu ka ogaado sharciyada kandidada oo uu ka soo bandhigayo xafiiska shaqada ee LMs. Xukummada kandidada waxaa lagu xukumaa khabiiriyiinta biniaadamka, sharciyada la aqbalayna waxaa loo isticmaalaa inuu sameeyo alaabta taageerada ah oo uu ku xoogeeyo modellka joogta ah. Imtixaanka afarta shaqooyin waxay ka muuqataa PRBoost oo ku qoran qoraalka qoriga ah oo aad u qoran karto 7.1\\%, wuxuuna sameynayaa burburka oo uu ku sameynayo modello aad u ilaalisan.', 'sv': 'Svagt övervakat lärande (WSL) har visat lovande resultat när det gäller att hantera etikettbrist på många NLP-uppgifter, men manuellt utforma en omfattande uppsättning märkningsregler av hög kvalitet är tråkigt och svårt. Vi studerar interaktivt svagt övervakat lärande --- problemet med iterativt och automatiskt upptäcka nya märkningsregler från data för att förbättra WSL-modellen. Vår föreslagna modell, kallad PRBoost, uppnår detta mål genom iterativ promptbaserad regelupptäckt och modellförstärkning. Den använder förstärkning för att identifiera förekomster av stora fel och upptäcker kandidatregler från dem genom att uppmana förhandsutbildade LM:er med regelmallar. Kandidatreglerna bedöms av mänskliga experter och de godkända reglerna används för att skapa kompletterande svaga märkningar och stärka den nuvarande modellen. Experiment på fyra uppgifter visar att PRBoost överträffar toppmoderna WSL-baslinjer upp till $7,1\\%$, och överbryggar luckorna med fullt övervakade modeller.', 'si': 'Weather-supervised learnt (WSL) has exhibited prompting scores in address of label weakesty on a number of NLP jobbles, but handly Designing a comprehersive, high-level Labling Rules set is tedious and diffuse. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ නිර්භාවිතයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නියෝජනය WSL මොඩල් වැඩ කරන්න. අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, PRBoost නමයි, මේ අරමුණ අවස්ථාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ නීතිය හොයාගන්න සහ ම ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල වැරැද්ද විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නීතිය හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබුන ප්\u200dරශ්න නීතියක් මිනිස්සු විශ්වාසිකයෝ වලින් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න නීතියක් ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය කරනවා  කාර්ය හතරයි පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ PRBoost ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විදියට WSL ස්ථානයේ විදියට $7.1\\% $ වෙනුවෙන්, සහ ප', 'ta': 'மிகவும் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட படிப்பு நாங்கள் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது பலவீனமான மேலாண்மையில் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட கல்வியை கற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம் - உருவாக்கத்தில் பிரச்சனையும் தா PRBoost என்ற பெயர் நம்முடைய பரிந்துரைய மாதிரி, உருவாக்கிய விதிமுறை கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் மாதிரி உருவாக்குதல் மூலம்  It uses boosting to identify large-error instances and discovers candidate rules from them by prompting pre-trained LMs with rule templates.  தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட விதிகள் மனிதர்களால் தீர்ப்பளிக்கப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் ஏற்றுக் கொள்ளப்பட்ட விதிகள் சிகிச்சைப் நான்கு பணிகளில் உள்ள முயற்சிகள் PRBoost வெளியேறும் நிலையை வெளியேற்றும் பார்க்கிறது $7. 1\\%, மற்றும் முழு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளுடன்', 'ur': 'کمزور تحقیق کی تعلیم (WSL) نے بہت سی NLP کاموں پر لیبل کمزوری کا تحقیق کرنے کے نتیجہ دکھایا ہے لیکن اس کے ذریعہ مکمل اور مشکل ہے کہ ایک محکم، بڑی کیفیت لیبلینگ قانون کی طراحی کرنا ہے۔ ہم کمزور تحقیق کی تعلیم کی تعلیم پڑھ رہے ہیں - دوبارہ تحقیق کی اور دوبارہ تحقیق کی مسئلہ ڈیٹا سے نومین لابلینگ قانون کی تلاش کریں کہ WSL موڈل کو بہتر کریں۔ ہماری پیشنهاد مدل، PRBoost کے نام سے، یہ مقصد تکرار کرنے والی قانون کی وجہ سے پہنچ جاتی ہے اور مدل اضافہ کرنے کے ذریعہ۔ یہ بہت بڑی خطائیں اثنات کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے اور ان سے کڈینڈیٹ قانون کو اچھی طرح پیش آموزش کی LMs کو قانون ٹیپلٹوں کے ساتھ پکارتا ہے. کاندینڈیٹ قانون انسان کے علماء سے فیصلہ کیا جاتا ہے، اور قبول کی قانون کمزور لابل پیدا کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے اور موجود مدل کو مضبوط بنانے کے لئے۔ چار دنیا کی تجربیات PRBoost کی حالت-of-the-art WSL بنسلین کو 7.1\\$ تک دکھاتی ہے، اور پورے نظارت کے موڈل کے ساتھ فاصلے مٹاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Biz o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganamiz -- tashkilotda o'rganish muammolari va avtomatik o'rganish va WSL modelini o'zgartirish uchun novel yozib qoidalarini avtomatik o'rganamiz. PRBoost nomli modelmiz bu maqolani ishlab chiqarishi mumkinligi va model yozib kelishi mumkin. @ info: whatsthis The candidate rules are judged by human experts, and the accepted rules are used to generate complementary weak labels and strengthen the current model.  4 vazifalar bilan tajribalar PRBoost 7. 1\\% asosida saqlanadi va butun taʼminlovchi modellar bilan boshlanadi.", 'vi': 'Việc học tập được giám sát gắt gao (WSL) đã cho thấy kết quả hứa hẹn để giải quyết sự khan hiếm nhãn trên nhiều công việc khôn ngoan, nhưng việc thiết kế bằng tay một bộ luật sản xuất nhãn chất lượng cao là chán và khó khăn. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu về học dựa trên kĩ năng khéo léo...vấn đề lặp đi lặp lại và tự động khám phá ra các quy tắc hiệu mới từ dữ liệu để nâng cao kiểu WSL Mẫu chúng tôi đã đề nghị, tên là PRBoov, đạt được mục tiêu này bằng lặp lại việc tìm ra luật lệ và tăng cường mô hình. Nó dùng tăng cường để xác định các trường hợp lỗi lớn và phát hiện ra các quy tắc ứng cử viên từ đó bằng cách thúc đẩy LM được rèn luyện trước với mẫu quy định. Ứng viên được đánh giá bởi các chuyên gia, và những quy định đã được chấp nhận được sử dụng để tạo ra những nhãn hiệu yếu bổ sung và củng cố hình mẫu hiện tại. Thí nghiệm trên bốn nhiệm vụ cho thấy rằng Ngừng-dịch-ra-thực-hiện nền-thời-đại của WSL cho đến chưa đầy đủ các mô hình được giám sát.', 'hr': 'Duboko nadzirano učenje (WSL) pokazalo je obećavajuće rezultate u rješavanju nedostatka etiketa na mnogim zadacima NLP-a, ali je ručno dizajniranje sveobuhvatnog, visokokvalitetnog pravila označavanja dosadno i teško. Proučavamo interaktivno slabo nadzirano učenje -- problem iterativnog i automatskog otkrivanja pravila označavanja novih etiketa iz podataka kako bi poboljšali model WSL-a. Naš predloženi model, po imenu PRBoost, postigne ovaj cilj putem otkrivanja i pojačanja modela na iterativnom brzinom temelju pravila. Koristi jačanje za identifikaciju velikih pogrešnih slučajeva i otkrivanje pravila kandidata od njih potaknutim predobučenim LMs sa pravilnim šablovima. Pravila kandidata osuđuju ljudski stručnjaci, a prihvaćena pravila se koristi za stvaranje dodatnih slabi etiketi i jačanje trenutnog modela. Eksperimenti na četiri zadatke pokazuju da PRBoost nadmašuje osnovne linije stanja umjetnosti WSL-a do 7,1% $, i prebacuje praznine s potpuno nadgledanim modelima.', 'tr': 'Açan-gözleýän öwrenme (WSL) NLP täbliklerinde etiketleriň azalygyny barada söz berýän netijeleri görkezildi, ýöne elimden daşary we ýokary taýýarlama düzgüni düzenlemek üçin howply we kyndyr. Biz iň zayıf-gözleýän öwrenmek üçin etkileşimli hasaplanýan öwrenmek---iň tekrarly we otomatik görkezilişi roman etiketleme kurallaryny harplaryndan WSL modelini geliştirmek üçin öwrenmek üçin okaýarys. Biziň PRBoost adly nusgadymyz, bu maksady iteratiýaly bir nusga taýýarlanan düzgün açylyk we nusga artan şekilde başarar. Bu ýerde Ullakan hata çykyşlaryny tanamak üçin peýdalanýar we adalat çykyşlaryny görkezmek üçin ullanýar. Kanada kararlary ynsan uzmanlary tarapyndan hökmürläp görýär, we kabul edilen kararlar supplementer zayıf etiketler döretmäge we häzirki nusgyny güýçläp görkezmäge ulanýar. Dört zadyň barlamasynda PRBoost sanat eserleriniň durumynyň $7.1%-a çenli üýtgedigini görkez we gaplaryny tamamlandyrylýan nusgalar bilen köprüňleýär.', 'de': 'Schwach überwachtes Lernen (WSL) hat vielversprechende Ergebnisse bei der Bekämpfung von Label-Knappheit bei vielen NLP-Aufgaben gezeigt, aber das manuelle Entwerfen eines umfassenden, qualitativ hochwertigen Etikettierungsregelsatzes ist mühsam und schwierig. Wir untersuchen interaktives schwach überwachtes Lernen---das Problem der iterativen und automatischen Entdeckung neuartiger Beschriftungsregeln aus Daten zur Verbesserung des WSL-Modells. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell namens PRBoost erreicht dieses Ziel durch iterative prompt-basierte Regelfindung und Modellboosting. Es verwendet Boosting, um Instanzen mit großen Fehlern zu identifizieren und erkennt Kandidatenregeln aus ihnen, indem vortrainierte LMs mit Regelvorlagen aufgefordert werden. Die Kandidatenregeln werden von menschlichen Experten beurteilt, und die akzeptierten Regeln werden verwendet, um ergänzende schwache Labels zu generieren und das aktuelle Modell zu stärken. Experimente an vier Aufgaben zeigen, dass PRBoost modernste WSL-Baselines bis zu $7,1%$übertrifftund Lücken mit vollständig überwachten Modellen überbrückt.', 'bg': 'Слабо контролираното обучение показа обещаващи резултати в справянето с недостига на етикети при много задачи от НЛП, но ръчното проектиране на изчерпателен и висококачествен набор от правила за етикетиране е досадно и трудно. Ние изучаваме интерактивното слабо контролирано обучение - проблемът за итеративно и автоматично откриване на нови правила за етикетиране от данни, за да подобрим модела. Нашият предложен модел, наречен PRBoost, постига тази цел чрез итеративно откриване на правила и повишаване на модела. Той използва усилване, за да идентифицира случаи с големи грешки и открива кандидатски правила от тях, като подканва предварително обучени LM с шаблони за правила. Правилата за кандидатстване се оценяват от човешки експерти, а приетите правила се използват за генериране на допълнителни слаби етикети и укрепване на настоящия модел. Експериментите по четири задачи показват, че превъзхожда най-съвременните базови линии на WSL до $7.1%$, и покрива пропуските с напълно контролирани модели.', 'id': 'Belajar yang diawasi dengan lemah (WSL) telah menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji dalam mengatasi kekurangan label pada banyak tugas NLP, tetapi secara manual merancang aturan label komprensif, kualitas tinggi set adalah membosankan dan sulit. We study interactive weakly-supervised learning---the problem of iteratively and automatically discovering novel labeling rules from data to improve the WSL model.  Model kami yang diusulkan, bernama PRBoost, mencapai tujuan ini melalui penemuan aturan yang mendasarkan dengan cepat dan meningkatkan model. Ini menggunakan penolakan untuk mengidentifikasi kejadian-kesalahan besar dan menemukan aturan kandidat dari mereka dengan meminta LMs terlatih praprajurit dengan templat aturan. The candidate rules are judged by human experts, and the accepted rules are used to generate complementary weak labels and strengthen the current model.  Eksperimen pada empat tugas menunjukkan PRBoost melebihi baris dasar WSL state-of-the-art sehingga $ 7,1%$, dan menyembunyikan celah-celah dengan model yang diawasi sepenuhnya.', 'af': "Weekly- supervised leer (WSL) het gewys beloftende resultate in adressing van etiket skandheid op baie NLP opdragte, maar hand ontwerp 'n kompleks, hoë- kwaliteit etiket reël stel is moeilik en moeilik. Ons studeer interaktief swak-ondersoekte leer---die probleem van iteratief en automaties om novel etiket reëls van data te ontdek om die WSL model te verbeter. Ons voorgestelde model, genaamd PRBoost, bereik hierdie doel deur iteratiewe prompt-gebaseerde reël ontdekking en model versterking. Dit gebruik die booster om groot- fout voorbeelde te identifiseer en ontdek kandidate reëls van hulle deur voorafgeleerde LMs te vra met reël templates. Die kandidatreëls word oordeel deur menslike eksperte, en die aanvaardige reëls word gebruik om complementeerde swake etikette te genereer en die huidige model te versterk. Eksperimente op vier opdragte vertoon PRBoost uitvoer state-of-the-art WSL basisline tot $7.1%, en brui die spasies met volledig ondersoekte modele.", 'da': "Svagt overvåget læring (WSL) har vist lovende resultater med hensyn til at håndtere mærkeknaphed på mange NLP-opgaver, men manuelt at designe et omfattende mærkningsreglesæt af høj kvalitet er kedeligt og vanskeligt. Vi studerer interaktiv svagt overvåget læring --- problemet med iterativt og automatisk at opdage nye mærkningsregler fra data for at forbedre WSL modellen. Vores foreslåede model, der hedder PRBoost, opnår dette mål via iterativ promptbaseret regelopdagelse og modelforbedring. Det bruger boosting til at identificere tilfælde med store fejl og opdage kandidatregler fra dem ved at bede forududdannede LM'er med regelskabeloner. Kandidatreglerne bedømmes af menneskelige eksperter, og de accepterede regler bruges til at skabe supplerende svage etiketter og styrke den nuværende model. Eksperimenter med fire opgaver viser, at PRBoost overgår de avancerede WSL-basislinjer på op til $7,1%$, og browser hullerne med fuldt overvågede modeller.", 'ko': '약감독학습(WSL)은 많은 NLP 작업 중의 라벨 희소 문제를 해결하는 데 좋은 효과를 보였지만 전면적이고 질 좋은 라벨 규칙집을 수동으로 설계하는 것은 번거롭고 어렵다.우리는 WSL 모델을 개선하기 위해 상호작용식 약한 감독 학습 - 데이터에서 새로운 표기 규칙을 반복적으로 발견하는 문제를 연구했다.우리가 제시한 모델은 PRBoost로 교체된 힌트를 바탕으로 하는 규칙적 발견과 모델 강화를 통해 이 목표를 실현한다.boosting을 사용하여 대형 오류 사례를 식별하고 규칙 템플릿을 사용하여 미리 훈련된 LMs를 알려 후보 규칙을 발견합니다.후보 규칙은 인류 전문가들이 판단하고 받아들여진 규칙은 상호 보완의 약한 라벨을 생성하고 현재 모델을 강화하는 데 사용된다.PRBoost는 네 가지 임무에 대한 실험에서 가장 선진적인 WSL 베이스라인보다 최고 7.1% 우수한 성능을 보였으며, 이 차이를 완전한 감독 모델을 통해 보완했다.', 'az': 'Zayıf-gözləməli öyrənmək (WSL) NLP işlərinin çoxluğunda etiket zəifliyini çəkmək üçün və ’ d verici sonuçlarını göstərdi, amma manually designed a comprehensive, high-quality etiket rule set is borçlu və çətin. Biz çox zəif təşkil edilmiş öyrənməyi təhsil edirik-- yenidən və avtomatik olaraq məlumatlardan yeni etiketli qaydaları keşf edirik ki, WSL modelini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün. Bizim PRBoost adlı təklif modelimiz bu məqsədini iterativ tələb edilmiş qaydalar keşfetməsi və modeli artırmaq vasitəsilə başa düşər. Bu, böyük xəta örnəklərini təsdiqləmək üçün və onlar təhsil edilmiş xəta örnəklərini təsdiqləmək üçün təhsil edir. Kandidata qaydaları insan ekspertləri tarafından hökm edir, və qəbul edilmiş qaydalar çox zəif etiketlər olub hökmən modelini qüvvətləndirir. Dörd işlərin təcrübələri PRBoost-in-the-art WSL əsas səhifələrini 7,1$ qədər göstərir və bu səhifələri tamamlanmış modellərlə körpənir.', 'sq': 'Mësimi me mbikqyrje të dobët (WSL) ka treguar rezultate premtuese në trajtimin e mungesës së etiketave në shumë detyra NLP, por dizajnimi manual i një rregulli të përgjithshëm, të cilësisë së lartë të etiketave është i mërzitshëm dhe i vështirë. Ne studiojmë mësimin interaktiv të mbikqyrur dobësisht-- problemi i zbulimit të rregullave të etiketave të reja nga të dhënat për të përmirësuar modelin WSL. Modeli ynë i propozuar, i quajtur PRBoost, arrin këtë qëllim nëpërmjet zbulimit të shpejtë të rregullave dhe rritjes së modelit. Ajo përdor nxitje për të identifikuar raste gabimi të madh dhe zbulon rregulla kandidate nga ato duke nxitur LMs të paratrajnuara me modele rregullash. Rregullat e kandidatit gjykohen nga ekspertët njerëzorë dhe rregullat e pranuara përdoren për të gjeneruar etiketa komplementare të dobëta dhe për të forcuar modelin aktual. Eksperimentet në katër detyra tregojnë se PRBoost përforcon linjat bazë të WSL-së më të larta deri në 7.1% dollarë dhe mbulon mungesat me modele të mbikqyrur plotësisht.', 'fa': 'یادگیری\u200cهای ضعیف تحت نظر (WSL) نتیجه\u200cی قول\u200cدهنده\u200cای را نشان داده است در addressing label scarcity on many NLP tasks, ولی دستی طراحی یک قانون نوشته\u200cهای پر کیفیت بالا خسته و سخت است. ما درس یادگیری با ضعیف تحقیق می کنیم-- مشکل تکرار و خودکار قانون نقاشی نویس را از داده ها کشف می کنیم تا مدل WSL را بهتر کند. مدل پیشنهاد ما، به نام PRBoost، این هدف را از طریق کشف و افزایش قانون ناگهانی بر پایه سریع تکرار می\u200cکند. این استفاده از افزایش برای شناسایی نمونه\u200cهای خطای بزرگ است و قانون کاندیداتی را از آنها کشف می\u200cکند با پیش آموزش LMs با نمونه\u200cهای قانونی. قانون کاندیداتی توسط متخصص بشر قانون می\u200cشوند، و قانون قبول برای تولید نقاشی ضعیف و قوی کردن مدل فعلی استفاده می\u200cشوند. تجربه\u200cهای چهار وظیفه به PRBoost نشان می\u200cدهد که پایگاه\u200cهای ایالت هنر WSL به حدود ۷.۱ دلار برسد، و فاصله\u200cها را با مدل\u200cهای کامل تحت نظر می\u200cگیرد پول می\u200cدهد.', 'bn': 'দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণের শিক্ষা (WSL) অনেক এনএলপি কাজের উপর লেবেলের দুর্দশা নিয়ে প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে, কিন্তু হাতে একটি সম্পূর্ণ, উচ্চমান লেব আমরা দুর্বল-দুর্বল পর্যবেক্ষণ শিক্ষা নিয়ে গবেষণা করছি- স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তথ্যের লেবেলিং নিয়ম খুঁজে বের করার জন্য আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল, পিআরবুস্ট, নামের এই লক্ষ্যের মাধ্যমে এই উদ্দেশ্য অর্জন করা হয়েছে দ্রুত-ভিত্তিক নিয়ম আবিষ্কা এটি বুস্টিং ব্যবহার করে বিশাল ত্রুটির ইনসেন্ট চিহ্নিত করতে এবং তাদের থেকে প্রার্থীর নিয়ম আবিষ্কার করতে পারে নিয়ম পূর্ব প্রশিক প্রার্থীদের নিয়ম মানুষ বিশেষজ্ঞের দ্বারা বিচার করেছেন এবং গ্রহণ করা নিয়ম ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে তারা দুর্বল লেবেল তৈ চার কাজের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে প্রিবুস্ট স্টেট-অফ-আর্ট ডায়ার্ট ডাব্লিউএসএলের বেসারেন্ট পরিচালিত হয়েছে ৭. ১%, এবং পুরোপুরি পর্', 'et': 'Nõrga järelevalvega õpe (WSL) on näidanud paljude uue tööprogrammi ülesannete puhul paljulubavaid tulemusi märgistuspuuduse vähendamisel, kuid tervikliku ja kvaliteetse märgistusreeglite käsitsi väljatöötamine on tüütu ja keeruline. Uurime interaktiivset nõrgalt juhendatud õppimist - probleemi uudsete märgistusreeglite iteratiivse ja automaatse avastamise probleemi andmetest WSL mudeli täiustamiseks. Meie pakutud mudel nimega PRBoost saavutab selle eesmärgi iteratiivse viipepõhise reeglite avastamise ja mudeli tõstmise kaudu. See kasutab tõhustamist suurte vigadega eksemplaride tuvastamiseks ja nende kandidaatrieglite avastamiseks, küsides reeglimallidega eelnevalt koolitatud LMidelt. Kandidaadireegleid hindavad inimeksperdid ning aktsepteeritud reegleid kasutatakse täiendavate nõrkade märgistuste loomiseks ja praeguse mudeli tugevdamiseks. Nelja ülesandega tehtud eksperimendid näitavad, et PRBoost ületab tipptasemel WSL baasjooni kuni 7,1%$, ja täidab lüngad täielikult järelevalve all olevate mudelitega.', 'bs': 'Duboko nadzirano učenje (WSL) pokazalo je obećavajuće rezultate u rješavanju nedostatka etiketa na mnogim zadacima NLP-a, ali je ručno dizajniranje sveobuhvatnog, visokokvalitetnog pravila za etiketiranje dosadno i teško. Proučavamo interaktivno slabo nadzirano učenje -- problema iterativnog i automatskog otkrivanja pravila označavanja novih etiketa iz podataka kako bi poboljšali model WSL-a. Naš predloženi model, po imenu PRBoost, postigne ovaj cilj putem otkrivanja i pojačanja modela na iterativnom brzinom temelju pravila. Koristi jačanje za identifikaciju velikih pogrešnih slučajeva i otkrivanje pravila kandidata od njih potaknutim predobučenim LMs sa pravilnim šablovima. Pravila kandidata osuđuju ljudski stručnjaci, a prihvaćena pravila se koristi za stvaranje dodatnih slabi etiketi i jačanje trenutnog modela. Eksperimenti na četiri zadatke pokazuju da PRBoost iznosi osnovne linije u državi umjetnosti WSL-a do 7,1% $, i prebacuje praznine sa potpuno nadzirenim modelima.', 'cs': 'Slabě dohlížené učení (WSL) ukázalo slibné výsledky při řešení nedostatku štítků u mnoha úkolů NLP, ale ruční navrhování komplexní, vysoce kvalitní sady pravidel označování je únavné a obtížné. Studujeme interaktivní slabě dohlížené učení---problém iterativního a automatického objevování nových pravidel značení z dat za účelem zlepšení WSL modelu. Náš navržený model s názvem PRBoost dosahuje tohoto cíle prostřednictvím iterativního zjišťování pravidel založeného na výzvě a posílení modelu. Používá posílení k identifikaci instancí s velkými chybami a zjišťuje z nich kandidátská pravidla výzvou k předškoleným LM s šablonami pravidel. Kandidátová pravidla jsou posuzována lidskými odborníky a přijatá pravidla slouží k generování doplňkových slabých značek a posílení současného modelu. Experimenty na čtyřech úlohách ukazují, že PRBoost překonává nejmodernější základní linie WSL až do $7,1%$apřeklenuje mezery s plně dohledem modelů.', 'fi': 'Heikkosti ohjattu oppiminen (WSL) on osoittanut lupaavia tuloksia etikettien niukkuuden poistamisessa monissa NLP-tehtävissä, mutta kattavan ja laadukkaan merkintäsääntökokonaisuuden manuaalinen suunnittelu on tylsää ja vaikeaa. Tutkimme vuorovaikutteista heikosti ohjattua oppimista - ongelmaa löytää iteratiivisesti ja automaattisesti uusia merkintäsääntöjä datasta WSL-mallin parantamiseksi. Ehdotettu PRBoost-mallimme saavuttaa tämän tavoitteen iteratiivisella prompt-pohjaisella sääntöetsinnällä ja mallien tehostamisella. Se tunnistaa suurten virheiden esiintymät tehostamalla ja löytää niistä ehdokassäännöt kehottamalla ennalta koulutettuja LM-malleja sääntömalleilla. Ehdokasäännöt arvioivat ihmisasiantuntijat, ja hyväksyttyjä sääntöjä käytetään täydentävien heikkojen merkkien luomiseen ja nykyisen mallin vahvistamiseen. Neljän tehtävän kokeet osoittavat, että PRBoost suoriutuu huippuluokan WSL-perusviivoista jopa 7,1%:iin asti, ja korjaa aukot täysin valvotuilla malleilla.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge mal supervisada (WSL) ha mostrat resultats prometedors en tractar l'escassetat d'etiquetes en moltes tasques de NLP, però el disseny manual d'una regla d'etiquetage completa i d'alta qualitat és tediós i difícil. Estudem l'aprenentatge interactiu amb una supervisió dèbil, el problema de descobrir repetidament i automàticament noves regles d'etiquetage a partir de les dades per millorar el model WSL. El nostre model proposat, anomenat PRBoost, aconsegueix aquest objectiu mitjançant el descobriment repetitiu de regles basades en ràpid i el reforç del model. Utilitza impulsos per identificar cas d'errors grans i descobrir les normes candidates d'ells promueixent els LMs pré-entrenats amb models de regles. Les normes candidates es jugen per experts humans, i les normes acceptades s'utilitzen per generar etiquetes dèbils complementars i fortalecer el model actual. Experiments on four tasks show PRBoost outperforms state-of-the-art WSL baselines up to $7.1%$, and bridges the gaps with fully supervised models.", 'hy': "Լավ վերահսկված ուսումնասիրությունը ցույց է տալիս խոստացնող արդյունքներ, որոնք կարող են լուծել բազմաթիվ ՆԼՊ-ի խնդիրների բացակայությունը, բայց ձեռքով ստեղծել ամբողջական, բարձր որակի պիտակումների կանոններ ձանձրալի է և դժվար: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ինտերակտիվ թույլ վերահսկվող ուսումնասիրությունը' կրկնօրինակ և ավտոմատ հայտնաբերելու խնդիրը տվյալներից նոր պիտակում գտնվող կանոնները, որպեսզի բարելավվի աշխարհային լավագույն Մեր առաջարկած մոդելը, որը կոչվում է PRBoost, հասնում է այս նպատակին կրկնվող արագ հիմնված կանոնների հայտնագործման և մոդելների աճի միջոցով: Այն օգտագործում է խրախուսելը մեծ սխալների բացահայտելու համար և հայտնաբերում է թեկնածուների կանոնները, խրախուսելով նախապատրաստված LM-ներին կանոնների մոդելներով: Ապագապանական կանոնները դատում են մարդկային մասնագետների կողմից, և ընդունված կանոնները օգտագործվում են համալրացող թույլ պիտակներ ստեղծելու և ներկայիս մոդելի ուժեղացման համար: Experiments on four tasks show PRBoost outperforms state-of-the-art WSL baselines up to $7.1%$, and bridges the gaps with fully supervised models.", 'am': 'በብዙ NLP ስራቶች ላይ የሚቆጠሩ የጦማር ትምህርት (WSL) የተስፋ ፍሬዎችን በመስጠት ያስታያል፤ ነገር ግን በተጨማሪና ከፍተኛ ታዋቂው የጽሑፍ ሥርዓት መቆጣጠር አካባቢ ነው፡፡ የአካባቢ ትምህርት እና የደካማ ትምህርት ማድረግ እና የመረጃ የኖሮውን የጽሑፎችን ሥርዓት ከዳታ ለማሻሻል እናስተምራለን፡፡ የፕ.አ.አ.ቡስት የተባለው የሞላው ሞዴል፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ ፈጥኖ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና ሞዴል መግለጫ አግኝቷል፡፡ የስህተት ግንኙነቶችን ለማግኘት እና የተሻለኞቹን ሥርዓት ለማግኘት በመጠቀም ይጠቅማል፡፡ የአካባቢው ሕግ በሰው አዋቂዎች ይፈርዳል፣ የተቀበሉትም ሥርዓቶች ደካማ ማውጣት እና የአሁኑን ሞዴል ለማበረታት ይጠቅማል፡፡ በአራቱ ስራ ላይ ፈተናዎች PRBoost የ-የ-የ-የ-አርእስት-ዩኤል መደገፊያውን ወደ 7.1 በመቶ ዶላር የሚያሳየው እና በሙሉ የተጠበቀው ሞዴላዎችን የሚገልጽ ነው፡፡', 'nl': 'Weakly-supervised learning (WSL) heeft veelbelovende resultaten laten zien bij het aanpakken van labelschaarste op veel NLP-taken, maar handmatig ontwerpen van een uitgebreide, hoogwaardige etiketteringsregelset is vervelend en moeilijk. We bestuderen interactief zwak-begeleid leren---het probleem van iteratief en automatisch ontdekken van nieuwe etiketteringsregels uit gegevens om het WSL-model te verbeteren. Ons voorgestelde model, genaamd PRBoost, bereikt dit doel via iteratieve prompt-based rule discovery en model boosting. Het gebruikt boosting om grote fouten te identificeren en ontdekt kandidaat-regels uit hen door vooraf getrainde LMs met regelsjablonen te vragen. De kandidaat-regels worden beoordeeld door menselijke experts, en de geaccepteerde regels worden gebruikt om complementaire zwakke labels te genereren en het huidige model te versterken. Experimenten met vier taken tonen aan dat PRBoost beter presteert dan state-of-the-art WSL baselines tot $7.1%$ende hiaten overbrugt met volledig begeleide modellen.', 'sw': 'Ufunzi ulioangaliwa vibaya (WSL) umeonyesha matokeo ya kuahidini katika kushughulikia ukosefu wa alama kwenye kazi nyingi za NLP, lakini kwa mikononi kuunda sheria ya ujumla na ubora wa juu ni mbaya na ngumu. Tunafuatilia elimu yenye udhaifu unaofuatiliwa –tatizo la kiutaratibu na kutambua kanuni za riwaya zinazoonyesha taarifa za kuboresha mtindo wa WSL. Mfano wetu wa pendekezo, anayeitwa PRBoost, unafikia lengo hili kwa kupitia utawala wa haraka unaotumika na kuongezeka kwa mifano. Inatumia kuboresha kutambua matukio makubwa ya makosa na kugundua sheria za wagombea kutoka kwao kwa kuanzisha Ms. wa LMs kwa kutumia namba za utawala. Sheria za wagombea zinahukumiwa na wataalamu wa binadamu, na sheria zilizokubaliwa zinatumiwa kutengeneza alama ngumu na kuimarisha mtindo wa sasa. Majaribio katika kazi nne yanaonyesha PRBoost inaonyesha misingi ya hali ya sanaa ya WSL hadi dola 7.1%, na inaonyesha mapambano yenye mifano yote inayofuatiliwa.', 'jv': 'Awak Awak dhéwé isih luwih-luwih basa luwih-luwih basa ngono nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno kuwi kesempatan sing beraksi ngono kuwi nggawe barang dhéwé kanggo ngerasakno model WSL. Kernel Digawe Kamendi hukum sing ditambah ning wong liya sing nggawe ning awak dhéwé ning wong liya, lan hukum sing akses dituruti kanggo ngelarang alat sing apik dhéwé, lan nggawe model sing ngentambah. names', 'ha': "Ana iya tsari da aka raunana (WSL) ya nuna fassaran mai yiwuwa ta yi wa'adi da matsalar ta wajen addressa nauyin label a kan aikin mãsu yawa na NLP, kuma amma yana danna da hannayen yana da tsarin rubutun mai cikakken, mai nauyi da kuma mai ƙunci. Ana karatun karatun karatun karatun masu rauni da ake tsare -ma'abũcin zartar da littafin da ke gane Rubuwan littafin da farat ɗaya daga dane-dane zuwa ya kyautata motel na WSL. @ action: button Yana amfani da boolean don ya gane shiryoyin ɓata masu girma kuma ya gane masu kanana daga gare su, kuma ya yi amfani da mai amfani da LM da sunan zaman tsari. Rukuman kandidana ana ana yi hukunci da wataalar mutane, kuma an yi amfani da sharĩ'a karɓi zuwa a ƙiƙiro alama masu rauni da kuma a ƙara misãlai da ke yanzu. Tajararin da ke kan aikin huɗu na nuna PRBoost na ƙarshen state-of-the-art WSL-based up to $7.1/%, kuma ya sami gaɓa da cikakken motel.", 'sk': 'Šibko nadzorovano učenje (WSL) je pokazalo obetavne rezultate pri reševanju pomanjkanja oznak pri številnih nalogah NLP, vendar je ročno oblikovanje celovitega, visokokakovostnega nabora pravil označevanja dolgočasno in težko. Proučujemo interaktivno šibko nadzorovano učenje – problem iterativnega in samodejnega odkrivanja novih pravil označevanja iz podatkov za izboljšanje modela WSL. Naš predlagani model, imenovan PRBoost, doseže ta cilj z iterativnim odkrivanjem pravil in povečanjem modela. Uporablja povečanje za prepoznavanje primerov velikih napak in odkrije kandidatna pravila iz njih tako, da poziva vnaprej usposobljene LM s predlogami pravil. Pravila kandidatov ocenjujejo človeški strokovnjaki, sprejeta pravila pa se uporabljajo za ustvarjanje dopolnilnih slabih oznak in krepitev sedanjega modela. Poskusi na štirih nalogah kažejo, da PRBoost presega najsodobnejše osnovne vrednosti WSL do 7,1 $\\%$, in premosti vrzeli s popolnoma nadzorovanimi modeli.', 'he': 'הלימודים בשליטה חלשה (WSL) הראו תוצאות מבטיחות להתמודד עם חסר תוויות במשימות רבות של NLP, אך עיצוב ידני כללי תוויות של איכות גבוהה קבוע הוא משעמם וקשה. אנו לומדים למידה אינטראקטיבית עם שליטה חלשה -- הבעיה של גילוי חוקי תיקון רומנים באופן אוטומטי וממשיך לשפר את מודל WSL. המודל המוצע שלנו, בשם PRBoost, משיג את המטרה הזו באמצעות גילוי חוקים מבוסס מיידי חוזר ומדליק מודל. הוא משתמש בהדחף כדי לזהות מקרים שגיאות גדולות ולגלות חוקים מועמדים מהם על ידי לייצר LMs מאומנים מראש עם דוגמנים חוקים. חוקי המועמדים שופטים על ידי מומחים אנושיים, והחוקים המקבלים משתמשים כדי ליצור תוויות חלשות נוספות ולחזק את המודל הנוכחי. ניסויים על ארבעה משימות מראים שהPRBoost מציג מעבר לשורות הבסיס של WSL חדשות עד 7.1 דולר, וגשר את הפערים עם דוגמנים מבוקשים לחלוטין.', 'bo': 'Weakly-supervised learning (WSL) has shown promising results in addressing label scarcity on many NLP tasks, but manually designing a comprehensive, high-quality labeling rule set is tedious and difficult. We study interactive weakly-supervised learning---the problem of iteratively and automatically discovering novel labeling rules from data to improve the WSL model. Our proposed model, named PRBoost, achieves this goal via iterative prompt-based rule discovery and model boosting. It uses boosting to identify large-error instances and discover candidate rules from them by prompting pre-trained LMs with rule templates. The candidate rules are judged by human experts, and the accepted rules are used to generate complementary weak labels and strengthen the current model. Experiments on four tasks show PRBoost outperforms state-of-the-art WSL baselines up to $7.1\\%$, and bridges the gaps with fully supervised models.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'التعلم المقيد متعدد المهام لحل المشكلة', 'es': 'Aprendizaje multitarea limitado para la resolución de puentes', 'fr': 'Apprentissage multitâche restreint pour une résolution de transition', 'pt': 'Aprendizado multitarefa restrito para resolução de ponte', 'ja': '橋渡し解決のための制約付きマルチタスク学習', 'zh': '以桥接分辨率之约束性多任务学', 'hi': 'ब्रिजिंग रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए विवश बहु-कार्य सीखना', 'ru': 'Ограниченное Многозадачное Обучение для Разрешения Моста', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Ilthasc Srianta le haghaidh Réiteach Idirlinne', 'hu': 'Korlátozott többfeladatos tanulás az áthidaló megoldáshoz', 'el': 'Περιορισμένη εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για την επίλυση γεφυρώσεων', 'ka': 'მრავალური დავალების განსწავლების განსხვავება', 'it': 'Apprendimento multi-task vincolato per la risoluzione di ponte', 'lt': 'Ribotas kelių užduočių mokymasis siekiant spręsti problemą', 'kk': 'Көп тапсырмаларды шектеу үшін бірнеше тапсырмаларды оқыту', 'mk': 'Ограничено мултизадачно учење за резолуција на преместување', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Berbagai Tugas Terhadir untuk Resolusi Jejarkan', 'ml': 'ബ്രിഡിങ്ങ് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിങ്ങിനുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോലി പഠിപ്പിച്ചു', 'mt': 'Tagħlim multikompiti ristrett għar-Riżoluzzjoni tal-Bridging', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдсэн олон ажил суралцах', 'no': 'Avgrensa læring av fleire oppgåver for brikkeoppløysing', 'pl': 'Ograniczone wielozadaniowe uczenie się na rzecz rozwiązywania pomostów', 'ro': 'Învățare multiactivă constrânsă pentru rezoluția de legătură', 'sr': 'ograničeno učenje više zadataka za rezoluciju preokretanja', 'si': 'බ්\u200dරිජිජ් විශේෂණය සඳහා ගොඩක් කාර්ය ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Waxbarashada shaqo badan', 'sv': 'Begränsad flerfunktionsinlärning för överbryggning av lösning', 'ta': 'பிரிட்டிங் திரைத்திறனுக்கான பல- பணி கற்றுக்கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது', 'ur': 'بریج ریزیزول کے لئے بہت سی ٹاکس سیکھنا محدود ہوا', 'vi': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Ограничено многозадачично обучение за свързване на резолюцията', 'da': 'Begrænset multi-task-læring til broløsning', 'nl': 'Beperkt multitask leren voor overbrugging van oplossingen', 'hr': 'ograničeno učenje mnogobrojnih zadataka za rezoluciju preokretanja', 'de': 'Eingeschränktes Multi-Task-Lernen zur Brückenlösung', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Multi-Tugas Terbatas untuk Resolusi Perangkatan', 'ko': '제약 다중 임무 학습 기반의 브리지 솔루션', 'fa': 'یادگیری بسیاری از کار\u200cهای محدود برای حل\u200cسازی', 'sq': 'Mësimi i kufizuar me shumë detyra për zgjidhjen e shkurtimit', 'sw': 'Kufundishwa kwa mafunzo ya kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya kutafuta suluhisho', 'tr': 'Çikgi Çaşyrymy üçin Köp-Taýgy Öwrenmek', 'af': 'Beperkteer Veelvuldige Opdrag Leer vir Bridging Resolusie', 'az': '칂칬z칲n칲rl칲k 칲칞칲n 칞ox-Task 칬yr톛nm톛si', 'hy': 'Անսահմանափակ բազմախնդիրներ սովորելու համար', 'bn': 'ব্রাইডিং রিজলেশনের জন্য প্রশিক্ষিত বহুবার কাজ শিক্ষা', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'ograničeno učenje mnogobrojnih zadataka za rezoluciju kršenja', 'ca': "Aprendiment multitascat restringit per a resoldre l'alliberament", 'et': 'Piirangud mitme ülesandega õppimine lahenduse ühendamiseks', 'cs': 'Omezené víceúkolové učení pro překlenování řešení', 'fi': 'Rajoitettu monitehtäväoppiminen sillanratkaisua varten', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'Constrained Multi-Task Learning for Bridging Resolution', 'bo': 'ཚད་འཛིན་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་བོའི་ལས་འགུལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས', 'sk': 'Omejeno večopravilno učenje za povezovanje ločljivosti'}
{'en': 'Knowledge of difficulty level of questions helps a teacher in several ways, such as estimating students’ potential quickly by asking carefully selected questions and improving quality of examination by modifying trivial and hard questions. Can we extract such benefits of instance difficulty in Natural Language Processing? To this end, we conduct Instance-Level Difficulty Analysis of Evaluation data (ILDAE) in a large-scale setup of 23 datasets and demonstrate its five novel applications: 1) conducting efficient-yet-accurate evaluations with fewer instances saving computational cost and time, 2) improving quality of existing evaluation datasets by repairing erroneous and trivial instances, 3) selecting the best model based on application requirements, 4) analyzing dataset characteristics for guiding future data creation, 5) estimating Out-of-Domain performance reliably. Comprehensive experiments for these applications lead to several interesting results, such as evaluation using just 5% instances (selected via ILDAE) achieves as high as 0.93 Kendall correlation with evaluation using complete dataset and computing weighted accuracy using difficulty scores leads to 5.2% higher correlation with Out-of-Domain performance. We release the difficulty scores and hope our work will encourage research in this important yet understudied field of leveraging instance difficulty in evaluations.', 'ar': 'ندرس إلى أي مدى يمكن تحسين أدوات حل الجسور الخاضعة للإشراف دون استخدام بيانات تجسير إضافية معنونة من خلال اقتراح إطار عمل تعليمي جديد مقيد متعدد المهام من أجل حل الجسور ، حيث (1) نصمم قيود تناسق المهام المشتركة لتوجيه عملية التعلم ؛ (2) التدريب المسبق على نموذج مرجع الكيان في إطار عمل متعدد المهام على كمية كبيرة من البيانات المرجعية المتاحة للجمهور ؛ و (3) دمج المعرفة السابقة المشفرة في أدوات الحل القائمة على القواعد. يحقق نهجنا نتائج متطورة على ثلاث هيئات تقييم قياسية.', 'es': 'Examinamos la medida en que los solucionadores de puentes supervisados pueden mejorarse sin emplear datos de puente etiquetados adicionales mediante la propuesta de un marco de aprendizaje multitarea restringido novedoso para la resolución de puentes, dentro del cual (1) diseñamos restricciones de coherencia entre tareas para guiar el proceso de aprendizaje; (2) entrenar previamente el modelo de correferencia de entidad en el marco multitarea sobre la gran cantidad de datos de correferencia disponibles públicamente; y (3) integrar el conocimiento previo codificado en solucionadores basados en reglas. Nuestro enfoque logra resultados de vanguardia en tres cuerpos de evaluación estándar.', 'fr': "Nous examinons dans quelle mesure les résolveurs de pontage supervisés peuvent être améliorés sans utiliser de données de pontage étiquetées supplémentaires en proposant un nouveau cadre d'apprentissage multitâche contraint pour la résolution des ponts, dans lequel nous (1) concevons des contraintes de cohérence entre les tâches pour guider le processus d'apprentissage\xa0; (2) préentraîner le modèle de coréférence d'entité dans le cadre multitâche sur la grande quantité de données de coréférence accessibles au public\xa0; et (3) intégrer les connaissances antérieures codées dans des résolveurs basés sur des règles. Notre approche permet d'obtenir des résultats de pointe sur trois corpus d'évaluation standard.", 'pt': 'Examinamos até que ponto os resolvedores de ponte supervisionados podem ser aprimorados sem empregar dados de ponte rotulados adicionais, propondo uma nova estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa restrita para resolução de ponte, dentro da qual (1) projetamos restrições de consistência entre tarefas para orientar o processo de aprendizagem; (2) pré-treinar o modelo de correferência de entidade na estrutura multitarefa na grande quantidade de dados de correferência publicamente disponíveis; e (3) integrar o conhecimento prévio codificado em resolvedores baseados em regras. Nossa abordagem alcança resultados de última geração em três corpora de avaliação padrão.', 'ja': '私たちは、橋渡し解決のための新規の制約付きマルチタスク学習フレームワークを提案することにより、追加のラベル付けされた橋渡しデータを採用せずに、監視された橋渡し解決者がどの程度改善できるかを検討します。このフレームワークでは、(1)学習プロセスを導くためのクロスタスク一貫性制約を設計します。(2)大量の公開されたコアレファレンスデータにマルチタスクフレームワーク内のエンティティコアレファレンスモデルを事前にトレーニングします。(3)ルールベースの解決者にエンコードされた既存の知識を統合します。当社のアプローチは、3つの標準評価団体で最先端の結果を達成します。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем степень, в которой контролируемые мостовые решатели могут быть улучшены без использования дополнительных помеченных мостовых данных, предлагая новую ограниченную многозадачную обучающую структуру для разрешения моста, в рамках которой мы (1) разрабатываем межзадачные ограничения согласованности для руководства процессом обучения; (2) предварительно обучаем модель базовой сущности в многозадачной структуре на большом объеме общедоступных базовых данных; и (3) интегрируем предыдущие знания, закодированные в основанных на правилах решателях. Наш подход позволяет достичь самых современных результатов в трех стандартных оценочных корпорациях.', 'zh': '臣等条上新约多任务学框架以究监督桥接解析器可于不用额外标记桥接数者改进,其中(1)设意跨任一致性约束以导之。 (2)于多任务框架之中,明可用者指征数推理模型之预也。 (3)整合在解析器中编码先验知。 吾法于三准评语料库上最先进也。', 'hi': 'हम इस बात की जांच करते हैं कि पर्यवेक्षित ब्रिजिंग रिज़ॉल्वरों को ब्रिजिंग रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए एक उपन्यास विवश बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करके अतिरिक्त लेबल वाले ब्रिजिंग डेटा को नियोजित किए बिना सुधारा जा सकता है, जिसके भीतर हम (1) सीखने की प्रक्रिया का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए क्रॉस-टास्क स्थिरता बाधाओं को डिजाइन करते हैं; (2) सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध coreference डेटा की बड़ी राशि पर बहु-कार्य ढांचे में इकाई coreference मॉडल को पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित; और (3) नियम-आधारित रिज़ॉल्वर में एन्कोडेड पूर्व ज्ञान को एकीकृत करना। हमारा दृष्टिकोण तीन मानक मूल्यांकन निगम पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Scrúdaímid a mhéid is féidir réititheoirí idirlinne maoirsithe a fheabhsú gan sonraí breise lipéadaithe idirlinne a úsáid trí chreat foghlama il-tasc núíosach srianta a mholadh le haghaidh réiteach idirlinne, ina ndéanaimid (1) srianta comhsheasmhachta tras-tascanna a dhearadh chun an próiseas foghlama a threorú; (2) samhail chroílár an eintitis a réamhoiliúint sa chreat il-tasc maidir leis an méid mór sonraí croíchomhdhála atá ar fáil go poiblí; agus (3) réamheolas atá ionchódaithe i réititheoirí bunaithe ar rialacha a chomhtháthú. Baineann ár gcur chuige amach torthaí úrscothacha ar thrí chorparáid chaighdeánach mheastóireachta.', 'hu': 'Megvizsgáljuk, hogy a felügyelt áthidaló szanálók milyen mértékben fejleszthetők további címkézett áthidaló adatok alkalmazása nélkül, új, korlátozott többfeladatú tanulási keretrendszer javaslatával az áthidaló szanáláshoz, amelyen belül (1) a feladatok közötti következetességi korlátokat tervezünk a tanulási folyamat irányítására; (2) a többfeladatos keretrendszerben a gazdálkodó egységek coreferencia modelljének előkészítése a nyilvánosan hozzáférhető coreferencia adatok nagy mennyiségére; és (3) a szabályalapú feloldókban kódolt korábbi ismeretek integrálása. A megközelítésünk a legkorszerűbb eredményeket ér el három standard értékelő testületen.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევხედავთ რამდენიმე განსაკუთრებული ბრიგების განსაკუთრებელების განსაკუთრებით შეგვიძლია უფრო მეტი დასაკუთრებული ბრიგების მონაცემების გამოყენება, რომელსაც ჩვენ (1) განსაკუთრებულების კონსტენსტის განსაკუთრებულების განსა (2) მრავალური დავალების ფრამეტში ინტერტიკის მოდელს წინ გავაგრძნოთ უფრო დიდი მონაცემების მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები; და (3) წინაღალდე მეცნიერების ინტერგურაცია, რომლებიც კოდირებულიან პროლექტორებში. ნაქთჲრ ოპთლთფ ეჲჟრთდნაგა პვჱსლრართრვ ნა ჟრანეაპნარა ჲценკა კჲპოჲპა.', 'it': "Esaminiamo la misura in cui i risolutori di bridge supervisionati possono essere migliorati senza utilizzare ulteriori dati di bridge etichettati proponendo un nuovo quadro di apprendimento multi-task vincolato per la risoluzione di bridge, all'interno del quale (1) progettiamo vincoli di coerenza cross-task per guidare il processo di apprendimento; (2) pre-formare il modello di coreferenza dell'entità nel quadro multi-task sulla grande quantità di dati di coreferenza disponibili al pubblico; e (3) integrare conoscenze precedenti codificate in resolver basati su regole. Il nostro approccio raggiunge risultati all'avanguardia su tre corpi di valutazione standard.", 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε τον βαθμό στον οποίο οι εποπτευόμενοι διορθωτές γεφύρωσης μπορούν να βελτιωθούν χωρίς τη χρήση πρόσθετων δεδομένων γεφύρωσης, προτείνοντας ένα νέο περιορισμένο μαθησιακό πλαίσιο πολλαπλών εργασιών για την επίλυση γεφύρωσης, εντός του οποίου (1) σχεδιάζουμε περιορισμούς συνοχής μεταξύ εργασιών για να καθοδηγήσουμε τη μαθησιακή διαδικασία. (2) προεκπαίδευση του μοντέλου συγχορήγησης οντότητας στο πλαίσιο πολλαπλών εργασιών σχετικά με τη μεγάλη ποσότητα διαθέσιμων στο κοινό δεδομένων συγχορήγησης· και (3) την ενσωμάτωση προηγούμενων γνώσεων κωδικοποιημένων σε επεξεργαστές ανάλυσης βάσει κανόνων. Η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε τρία τυποποιημένα σώματα αξιολόγησης.', 'kk': 'Біз көпшілікті шешушілерді қалай көпшілікті шешу үшін романдық көпшілікті білім оқыту фреймісін ұсынып, оның ішінде біз (1) оқыту процесін бағыттау үшін бірнеше тапсырманың шектеулерін құрастырып жасай аламыз. (2) бірнеше тапсырма бағдарламасының қасиеттерінің көп тапсырмалар бағдарламасының қасиеттерінің үлгісін алдын- ала тұру; көп тапсырмалар бағдарламасының көп қасиеттер және (3) ережелер негізінде кодталған мәліметтерді біріктіру. Біздің тәсіліміміз үш стандартты оқу корпорасының күйінің нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'We examine the extent to which supervised bridging resolvers can be improved without employing additional labeled bridging data by proposing a novel constrained multi-task learning framework for bridging resolution, within which we (1) design cross-task consistency constraints to guide the learning process;  (2) да го предобучи моделот на конференција на ентитетот во рамката за мултизадачи за големата количина на јавно достапни конферентни податоци; и (3) интегрирање на претходното знаење кодирано во решавачи базирани на правила. Нашиот пристап постигнува најдобри резултати на три стандардни проценки.', 'lt': 'Nagrinėdami, kokiu mastu galima pagerinti prižiūrėtus tarpusavio ryšio šalinimo įrenginius be papildomų ženklintų tarpusavio ryšio duomenų, siūlome naują ribotą daugiafunkcinio mokymosi sistemą, skirtą tarpusavio ryšio šalinimo problemoms spręsti, kurioje (1) parengiame tarpusavio darbo nuoseklumo apribojimus mokymosi procesui vadovauti; (2) iš anksto parengti subjekto atitikties model į daugiafunktyje sistemoje dideliu visuomenei prieinamų atitikties duomenų kiekiu; ir (3) išankstinių žinių, koduotų taisyklėmis grindžiamuose sprendimuose priimančiuose sprendimuose, integravimą. Mūsų požiūris pasiekia naujausius rezultatus trijų standartinių vertinimo korporų atžvilgiu.', 'ms': 'Kami memeriksa jangkauan ke mana penyelesair jembatan yang diawasi boleh diperbaiki tanpa menggunakan data jembatan yang ditabel tambahan dengan melaporkan rangkaian pembelajaran multi-tugas terbatas yang baru untuk resolusi jembatan, di dalam mana kami (1) merancang batasan konsistensi tugas salib untuk memimpin proses pembelajaran; (2) melatih model rujukan entiti dalam kerangka tugas-berbilang pada jumlah besar data rujukan yang tersedia secara awam; dan (3) mengintegrasikan pengetahuan terdahulu terkod dalam penyelesaian berdasarkan peraturan. pendekatan kita mencapai keputusan terbaik pada tiga korpora penilaian piawai.', 'mn': 'Бид дамжуулагчдын шийдвэрлэгчдийн хэрхэн ажиллаж байгааг судалж, суралцах процессийг удирдах шаардлагатай шинэ хэмжээст олон ажил суралцах үйл ажиллагааны шийдвэр гаргаж чадахгүй нэмэлт өгөгдлийг ашиглахгүй сайжруулж болох вэ? (2) Олон ажлын хэмжээнд олон ажлын хэмжээний зөвшөөрөл өгөгдлийн тоо хэмжээний олон ажлын загварын загварыг өмнө суралцах юм. (3) хууль дахь шийдвэрлэгчид шийдвэрлэгдсэн өмнөх мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх болно. Бидний арга баримт 3 стандарт дүгнэлтийн корпора дээр урлагийн төвшин үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nħarsu sa liema punt jistgħu jittejbu s-soluturi ta’ pont superviżi mingħajr ma ntużaw dejta ta’ pont ittikkettata addizzjonali billi nipproponu qafas ġdid ta’ tagħlim b’ħafna kompiti ristrett għal riżoluzzjoni ta’ pont, li fih (1) niddisinjaw restrizzjonijiet ta’ konsistenza bejn kompiti biex niggwidaw il-proċess ta’ tagħlim; (2) jitħarreġ minn qabel il-mudell ta’ koerenza tal-entità fil-qafas ta’ diversi kompiti dwar l-ammont kbir ta’ dejta ta’ koerenza disponibbli għall-pubbliku; u (3) l-integrazzjoni ta’ għarfien minn qabel ikkodifikat f’riżoluturi bbażati fuq ir-regoli. L-approċċ tagħna jikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fuq tliet korpi standard ta’ evalwazzjoni.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker kor mykje oversikte brytingar kan forbetrast utan å bruka fleire merkelige brytingardata ved å foreslå eit nytt begrensa multioppgåve-læringsrammeverket for brytinga av oppløysing, der vi (1) utformar avgrensingar for kryss-oppgåve for å hjelpa læringsprosessen. (2) først treng entitetskoreferencemodellen i fleire oppgåver på stor mengda tilgjengelege koreferencesdata; og og (3) integrerer førre kunnskap kodert i regelbaserte oppløysar. Tilnærminga vårt gjer resultatet av kunsten på tre standard evalueringskorpora.', 'ml': 'ബ്രിഡ്ജിങ്ങ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ചിട്ടപ്പെടുത്തിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാതെ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ലേബിങ്ങ് ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിക്കാതെ നോവല്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ ഒരു പ്രവർത (2) മുന്\u200dട്രെയിന്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200d ചെയ്യുക, കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് ഡേറ്റായിട്ടുള്ള വസ്തുവിന്\u200dറെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ വലിയ പ്രസ (3) നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിനു മുമ്പ് ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നതാണ്. നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം മൂന്നു സാധാരണ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു.', 'pl': 'Badamy, w jakim stopniu nadzorowane rozwiązania pomostowe można ulepszyć bez stosowania dodatkowych oznaczonych danych pomostowych, proponując nowe ograniczone ramy uczenia się wielozadaniowego dla rozwiązywania pomostowego, w ramach których (1) projektujemy ograniczenia spójności między zadaniami, aby kierować procesem uczenia się; (2) wstępne szkolenie modelu współdziałania podmiotu w ramach wielozadaniowych na temat dużej ilości publicznie dostępnych danych dotyczących współdziałania; oraz (3) integrując wiedzę wcześniejszą zakodowaną w rozwiązaniach opartych na regułach. Nasze podejście osiąga najnowocześniejsze wyniki na trzech standardowych korpusach oceny.', 'ro': 'Examinăm măsura în care pot fi îmbunătățite dispozitivele supravegheate de soluționare a punților de legătură fără a utiliza date suplimentare etichetate de legătură prin propunerea unui nou cadru de învățare multisarcină constrâns pentru soluționarea punților de legătură, în cadrul căruia (1) concepem constrângeri de coerență între sarcini pentru a ghida procesul de învățare; (2) pregătirea prealabilă a modelului de corefență a entității în cadrul multifuncțional cu privire la cantitatea mare de date de corefență disponibile publicului; și (3) integrarea cunoștințelor anterioare codificate în dispozitive de rezolvare bazate pe reguli. Abordarea noastră obține rezultate de ultimă oră pe trei corporații standard de evaluare.', 'sr': 'Ispitujemo u kakvoj mjeri može se poboljšati nadzorni rezolutori mostovanja bez zapošljavanja dodatnih označenih podataka mostovanja predloženjem novog ograničenog okvira učenja multizadataka za mostovanje rezolucije, u kojoj (1) dizajniramo ograničenje konsekvencije prekršnih zadataka da vodimo proces učenja; (2) predvježbati model pristojnosti subjekta u multizadatkovom okviru o velikoj količini javno dostupnih podataka o pristojnosti; i (3) integracija prethodnih znanja kodiranih na pravilima. Naš pristup postiže rezultate umetnosti na tri standardna procjena korpora.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා විශාලයක් කියලා බලාපොරොත්තු බ්\u200dරිජින් විශේෂකයන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ නැති විශාලයක් ලෙබ්රිජ් දත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  (2) ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි කාර්යාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අ ඒ වගේම (3) කලින් දැනගන්න පුරාවන් දැනගන්නේ නීතිය අධාරිත විශ්වාසකයෙන්. අපේ විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය තුනක් ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණ කරුණාකරණය තුනක් තියෙනවා.', 'so': "Waxaynu baaraynaa in lagu bedelayo go’aanka sameynta isbedelka kooxaha isbedelka, iyadoo aan la helin macluumaad dheeraad ah oo la xiriiray, waxaana lagu soo jeedinayaa qorshaha waxbarashada shaqaalaha oo la qasbay qoraalka iskuulka kooxaha isbedelka, waxaana ku qoran (1) qasabka kooxaha iskuulka si aan u hagno baaritaanka waxbarashada; (2) Tusaale qofka aqoonsiga ee shaqada badan ku tababarida macluumaadka kaararka ee caadiga ah oo aad u badan; (3) la isku qabsashada aqoonta hore oo ku qoran go'aanka sharciga. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa fasaxa xaaladda farshaxanka ee saddexda shirkad qiimeynta standardka ah.", 'sv': 'Vi undersöker i vilken utsträckning övervakade överbryggningslösningar kan förbättras utan att använda ytterligare märkta överbryggningsdata genom att föreslå en ny begränsad fleruppgiftsram för överbryggningslösning, inom vilken vi (1) utformar begränsningar för tväruppgiftsövergripande för att vägleda inlärningsprocessen. (2) Förutbilda enhetscoreferencemodellen i ramverket för flera uppgifter på den stora mängden offentligt tillgängliga coreferencedata. och (3) Integrera tidigare kunskaper kodade i regelbaserade resolvers. Vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår toppmoderna resultat på tre standardutvärderingskorpora.', 'ur': 'ہم اسے تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کس طرح تحقیق کی جگہ پلیٹنگ حل کرنے والوں کو اضافہ لابل لیٹنگ ڈاٹی کے مطابق استعمال نہ کر سکتے ہیں اس طرح ایک نئی مضبوط multi-task learning framework کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہے جہاں ہم (1) کرس-ٹاکس کنٹنس محدودیت کی محدودیت کرتی ہیں کہ تعلیم پرسس کو راہ دکھ (2) انٹیٹیٹ کی مہربانی موڈل کو پہلے ٹرین کریں multi-task framework وں میں بہت بڑے موجود موجود مہربانی ڈیٹے کے اندر; اور (3) پہلے علم کا ایک جمع کرتا ہے جو قانون کی بنیاد رسولوں میں سیدھا کیا گیا ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ تین استاندارڈ ارتفاع کے شرکت کے نتائج پہنچتا ہے.', 'ta': 'நாம் பரிசோதிக்க வேண்டும் பிரிட்டிங் தீர்வுகள் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை நாம் பரிசோதிக்க வேண்டும் எந்த அளவு முடியும் ஆனால் கூடுதல் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தகவலை பயன (2) பல பணி சட்டத்தில் உள்ள பொருள் குறிப்பு மாதிரியை முன் பயிற்சி செய்யவும் பெரிய பொருள் குறிப்பு தகவல்களின் அளவு; (3) விதிமுறையான தீர்வுகளில் குறிப்பிட்ட முன் அறிவை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும். நம்முடைய செயல்பாடு மூன்று நிலையான மதிப்பினை நிலையில் முடிவுகள் அடையும்.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi kiểm tra xem dự án kết nối giám sát có thể cải thiện được bao nhiêu nếu không sử dụng các dữ liệu kết nối thêm bằng cách đề xuất một cơ sở để học tập nhiều nhiệm vụ mới để kết nối giải quyết, trong đó chúng tôi (1) thiết kế các giới hạn liên kết giữa các nhiệm vụ để hướng dẫn tiến trình học. (2) ưu tiên mô hình thực thể hạn chế tập hợp trong quy định đa nhiệm vụ về số lượng lớn dữ liệu hạn hẹp công khai có mặt; và(3) dung hòa các hiểu biết trước được mã hóa trong các giải pháp nguyên quy. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta đạt được kết quả hiện đại trên ba hạ sĩ đánh giá chuẩn.', 'uz': "Biz bir darajada bir necha vazifa o'rganish uchun bir qanchalik vazifa o'rganish tuzuvchisini o'rganish imkoniyatini boshqarishimiz mumkin. Bu yerda biz o'rganish vazifalarni ta'lim jarayonini tushunishga qaror qilish uchun bir necha vazifa o'rganish tuzuvchisining chegarasini o'zgartirib chiqarishimiz mumkin. @ info (3) qoidagi asosiy murakkablarida oldin bilimni birlashtirish. Our approach achieves state-of-the-art results on three standard evaluation corpora.", 'bg': 'Проучваме степента, до която надзорните мостови решаващи устройства могат да бъдат подобрени, без да се използват допълнителни маркирани мостови данни, като предлагаме нова ограничена рамка за обучение с множество задачи за мостово решаване, в рамките на която (1) проектираме ограничения за последователност между задачите, които да ръководят процеса на обучение; (2) предварително се обучава модела на съвместна референция на субектите в рамката на многозадачите относно голямото количество публично достъпни данни за съвместна референция; и (3) интегриране на предишни знания, кодирани в базирани на правила решения. Нашият подход постига най-съвременни резултати на три стандартни корпуса за оценка.', 'nl': "We onderzoeken in hoeverre begeleide bridging resolvers kunnen worden verbeterd zonder gebruik te maken van extra gelabelde bridging data door een nieuw beperkt multi-task leerkader voor bridging resolutie voor te stellen, waarbinnen we (1) cross-task consistentie beperkingen ontwerpen om het leerproces te begeleiden; (2) het entiteitscoreferentiemodel in het multitask-kader vooraf trainen op de grote hoeveelheid publiek beschikbare coreferentiegegevens; en (3) integratie van voorkennis gecodeerd in regelgebaseerde resolvers. Onze aanpak bereikt state-of-the-art resultaten op drie standaard evaluatiecorpora's.", 'da': 'Vi undersøger, i hvilket omfang overvågede broløsningsanlæg kan forbedres uden at anvende yderligere mærkede broløsningsdata ved at foreslå en ny begrænset multi-task læringsramme til broløsning, inden for hvilken vi (1) designer konsistensbegrænsninger på tværs af opgaver for at styre læringsprocessen; (2) foruddanne enhedscoreferencemodellen i multi-task-rammen på den store mængde offentligt tilgængelige coreferencedata og (3) integrering af tidligere viden kodet i regelbaserede resolvere. Vores tilgang opnår state-of-the-art resultater på tre standardevalueringscorpora.', 'hr': 'Ispitujemo u kakvoj mjeri može se poboljšati nadzorni rezolutori mostovanja bez zapošljavanja dodatnih označenih podataka mostovanja prijedlogom novog ograničenog okvira učenja mnogobrojnih zadataka za rezoluciju mostovanja, u kojoj (1) dizajniramo ograničenje konsekvencije prekršnih zadataka kako bi vodili proces učenja; (2) predvježbati model pristojnosti subjekta u višezadatačnom okviru o velikoj količini javno dostupnih podataka o pristojnosti; i (3) integriranje prethodnih znanja kodiranih u rješavačima na temelju pravila. Naš pristup postiže rezultate stanja umjetnosti na tri standardna procjena korpora.', 'ko': '우리는 새로운 제약 다중 임무 학습 프레임워크를 제시함으로써 추가 표지 브리지 데이터를 사용하지 않는 상황에서 감독을 받는 브리지 분해기의 개선 정도를 연구하고 이 프레임워크에서 우리는 (1) 크로스 임무 일치성 제약을 설계하여 학습 과정을 지도한다.(2) 다중 임무 구조에서 대량으로 공개된 공지 데이터를 이용하여 실체 공지 모델에 대해 예비 훈련을 실시한다.그리고 (3) 규칙에 기반한 해석기에서 인코딩된 선험 지식을 통합한다.우리의 방법은 세 가지 표준 평가 자료 라이브러리에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 실현했다.', 'sw': 'Tunafikiri kiwango ambacho kinafuatilia suluhisho la madaraja zinaweza kuboreshwa bila kutumia taarifa za daraja zinazoonyesha zaidi kwa kupendekeza riwaya yenye msingi wa kujifunza kazi mbalimbali kwa ajili ya suluhisho la daraja, ambapo (1) tunatengeneza vikwazo vinavyotokana na kazi za kupita hatua ili kuongoza mchakato wa kujifunza; (2) Ufunzo wa awali modeli ya msingi katika mfumo wa kazi mbalimbali kwa kiasi kikubwa cha data za barabara zinazopatikana hadharani; na kuunganisha maarifa ya kabla yaliyojumuisha katika suluhisho la utawala. Hatua yetu inafanikiwa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye kampuni tatu ya uchunguzi.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen, inwieweit beaufsichtigte Bridging Resolver verbessert werden können, ohne zusätzliche markierte Bridging-Daten zu verwenden, indem wir ein neues eingeschränktes Multi-Task-Lernframework für Bridging Resolution vorschlagen, innerhalb dessen wir (1) aufgabenübergreifende Konsistenzbeschränkungen entwerfen, um den Lernprozess zu steuern; (2) das Coreferenz-Modell der Entität im Rahmen der Mehraufgaben im Hinblick auf die große Menge öffentlich verfügbarer Coreferenz-Daten vortrainieren; und (3) Integration von Vorkenntnissen in regelbasierten Resolvern. Unser Ansatz erzielt modernste Ergebnisse auf drei Standard-Evaluationskorpora.', 'id': 'Kami memeriksa jangkauan ke mana pemecah jembatan yang diawasi dapat diperbaiki tanpa menggunakan data jembatan yang ditandai tambahan dengan mengusulkan rangka pembelajaran multi-tugas terbatas baru untuk memecahkan resolusi, di dalam mana kami (1) merancang batas konsistensi tugas salib untuk memimpin proses pembelajaran; (2) melatih model koreferensi entitas dalam rangkaian multi-tugas pada jumlah besar data koreferensi yang tersedia publik; dan (3) mengintegrasikan pengetahuan sebelumnya terkode dalam penyelesaian berdasarkan aturan. pendekatan kita mencapai hasil terbaik pada tiga korpora evaluasi standar.', 'tr': 'Biz janlaşma çözümlerini gözlemýän taýýarlançylaryň esaslandyrylygyny çözmek üçin bir täze multi-täbli öwrenme çerçevesini tassyklap, içinde biz (1) çarp-täbli işgärläp öwrenme prosesyny gurlamak üçin esaslandyrylmagyň mümkinçiligini tassyklap bileris; (2) Birnäçe işgär çerçevesinde birnäçe işgär karýeterlik maglumatynda taýýarlan nusgasyny öňünden öňünden geçir; (3) kural tabanlı çözücülere kodlanmış öňki bilgi birleştirme. Biziň ýaryşymyz 3 standart deňleme korpoýasynyň durumyny ýetip barýar.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die uitbreiding waarop die ondersoekte bruidingsoplossing kan verbeter word sonder die gebruik van addisionele merkelige bruidingsdata deur 'n roman bevestig multi-taak leer raamwerk vir bruiding oplossing te voorstel, binne waarin ons (1) ontwerp kruis-taak konsistensie begrens om die leerproses te lei; (2) voorstrein die einditeit voorspoedigheidmodel in die multi-taak raamwerk op die groot hoeveelheid van openbaar beskikbaar koreferensiedata; en en (3) integreer vooraf kennis gekodeer in reëlbaseerde oplosserers. Ons toegang verkry staat van die kunste resultate op drie standaard evalueringskorpora.", 'fa': 'ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که چقدر حل\u200cکننده\u200cهای پل\u200cها را تحقیق می\u200cکنند بدون استفاده از داده\u200cهای پل\u200cگیری اضافه\u200cای با پیشنهاد یک چهارچوب یادگیری چندین کاری محدود شده برای حل\u200cگیری، که در آن (1) محدودیت\u200cهای کنترل\u200cگیری از کار\u200cها را طراحی می\u200cکنیم تا روش یادگیری را هدای (۲) پیش از آموزش مدل رضایت اجتماعی اجتماعی در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ و (۳) جمع کردن دانش پیشینیان که در حلگران قانونی متصل شده است. دستور ما به نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری در سه شرکت ارزیابی استاندارد رسیده است.', 'sq': 'Ne e shqyrtojmë shkallën në të cilën mund të përmirësohen zgjidhësit e urës të mbikqyrur pa përdorur të dhëna shtesë të shënuara të urës duke propozuar një kuadër të ri të kufizuar mësimi me shumë detyra për zgjidhjen e urës, brenda të cilit ne (1) dizajnojmë kufizime të konsistencës ndërdetyrore për të udhëzuar procesin e mësimit; (2) përpara trajnimit të modelit të korreferencës së njësisë në kuadrin e shumëdetyrave mbi sasinë e madhe të të dhënave të korreferencës në dispozicion publik; dhe (3) integrimin e njohurive të mëparshme të koduara në zgjidhësit bazuar në rregulla. Përqasja jonë arrin rezultate më të larta në tre korporata standarde të vlerësimit.', 'hy': "Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե որքանով կարող են վերահսկված կամուրջների լուծողները բարելավվել առանց օգտագործելու ավելին պիտակ կամուրջների տվյալներ' առաջարկելով նոր, սահմանափակ բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության շրջանակ լուծման կամուրջների լուծման համար, որտեղ մենք (1) ստեղծում ենք կամուրջ (2) նախապատրաստել կազմակերպության կորեֆերենսի մոդելը բազմախնդիրների շրջանակում հանրային հասանելի կորեֆերենսի տվյալների մեծ քանակի վրա: և (3) ինտեգրելով նախորդ գիտելիքները, որոնք կոդավորված են կանոններով հիմնված լուծողների մեջ: Մեր մոտեցումը հասնում է ամենակարևոր արդյունքների երեք ստանդարտ գնահատման մարմնի վրա:", 'am': 'የብሪክ ቀላቅሎችን ማስተማር ፍሬም ለመቀናቀል የተገኘውን የብዙ ትምህርት ትምህርት መሠረት ማድረጊያውን በማንቀላቀል በተጨማሪው የብሪክ አካባቢ ዳታዎችን በማስጠቀም እንዴት እንደደረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ (2) የአካባቢው የኮርፌንስ ሞዴል በተለየ ብዙው አድራሻ ውስጥ በተገኘው የኮርፌንስ ዳታ ላይ በተለየ ጊዜ አስቀድማቸው፤ (3) ከቀድሞ እውቀት የሥርዓት ትክክል መፍትሄ ውስጥ የተለየ ነው:: የሥርዓታችን ግንኙነት የዐርድ ፍሬዎችን በሦስት የድጋፍ አካውንት ኮሬፖር ላይ ያገኛል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz gözləyirik köprü çətinləşdiriciləri, öyrənmək prosesini doğru yola yönəltmək üçün yeni çoxlu iş öyrənmək çətinlikləri üçün müəyyən edilən çoxlu iş öyrənmə framework ünün istifadə etmədən daha yaxşılaşdırılabilir. (2) çoxlu işlər çerçivesindəki məlumatların böyük dəyişiklik məlumatlarının çoxlu dəyişiklik modelini əvvəl təhsil et; Və əvvəlki bilikləri hökmlərin dəyişikliklərinə kodlanmışdır. Bizim tərəfimiz üç standart değerlendirmə korporasının müəyyən edilməsi mümkün olar.', 'bn': 'আমরা পরীক্ষা করি যে পর্যায়ে ব্রিজিং সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়ন্ত্রণের পর্যায়ে আরো লেবেল করা ব্রিজিং ডাটা ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া আর কোন পর্যায়ে উন্নয়ন করা যাবে না ব্রিজের সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য একটি নোভেল ব (2) মাল্টিক কাজের ফ্রেমে বস্তুর কোরেফেন্স মডেলের পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে প্রকাশ্যে প্রাপ্ত কোরেফেন্স ডাট এবং (৩) শাসনের ভিত্তিক সিদ্ধান্তে পূর্বের জ্ঞান একত্রিত করা হয়েছে। আমাদের পদক্ষেপ তিনটি স্ট্যান্ডার্ড মুল্যায়ন কর্পোরায় রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ফলাফল অর্জন করে।', 'ca': "Examinem la mesura en què es poden millorar els resoldors de ponts supervisats sense utilitzar dades de ponts etiquetades adicionals proposant un nou marc d'aprenentatge multitasca restringit per a pontar la resolució, dins el qual (1) dissenyem restriccions de consistencia entre tasques per guiar el procés d'aprenentatge; (2) pré-formar el model de referència de l'entitat en el marc multitasca sobre la gran quantitat de dades de referència disponibles al públic; i (3) integrar coneixements anteriors codificats en resoldors basats en regles. El nostre enfocament aconsegueix resultats més avançats en tres corpores d'evaluació estándar.", 'bs': 'Ispitujemo u kakvoj mjeri može se poboljšati nadzorni rezolucionari mostovanja bez zapošljavanja dodatnih označenih podataka mostovanja predloženjem novog ograničenog okvira učenja multizadataka za prekidanje rezolucije, u kojoj (1) dizajniramo ograničenje konsekvencije prekršnih zadataka kako bi vodili proces učenja; (2) predvježbati model pristojnosti subjekta u multi task okviru o velikoj količini javno dostupnih podataka o pristojnosti; i (3) integracija prethodnih znanja kodiranih na pravilima rješavača. Naš pristup postiže rezultate stanja umjetnosti na tri standardne procjene korpore.', 'et': 'Uurime, millises ulatuses saab järelevalvega seotud lahendajaid parandada ilma täiendavate märgistatud sildadega seotud andmete kasutamiseta, pakkudes välja uue piiratud mitmeülesandelise õppe raamistiku, mille raames me (1) kujundame ülesannetevahelise järjepidevuse piirangud, et juhtida õppeprotsessi; (2) eelkoolitama üksuse ühiseks osutamiseks kasutatavat mudelit mitmeülesandelises raamistikus avalikult kättesaadavate ühiseks osutamiseks kasutatavate andmete suure hulga põhjal; ja (3) eelnevate teadmiste integreerimine reeglitel põhinevates lahendajates. Meie lähenemisviis saavutab tipptasemel tulemusi kolme standardse hindamiskorpora puhul.', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme, do jaké míry je možné zlepšit řešitele přemostění pod dohledem bez použití dalších označených přemostňovacích dat navrhnutím nového omezeného víceúkolového učebního rámce pro přemostnění řešení, v rámci něhož (1) navrhneme omezení konzistence mezi úkoly, abychom řídili proces učení; (2) předškolit model společné reference subjektů v rámci víceúkolového rámce na základě velkého množství veřejně dostupných údajů o společné referenci; a (3) integrování předchozích znalostí zakódovaných v řešitelích založených na pravidlech. Náš přístup dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků na třech standardních hodnotících korpusech.', 'fi': 'Tarkastelemme, missä määrin valvottuja sillanratkaisuratkaisuja voidaan parantaa ilman lisämerkittyjä sillanratkaisutietoja ehdottamalla uudenlaista rajattua monitehtäväoppimiskehystä sillanratkaisua varten, jossa (1) suunnittelemme tehtävien välisen johdonmukaisuuden rajoituksia ohjaamaan oppimisprosessia; (2) esikoulutetaan yksiköiden yhteisvertailumallia monitehtäväkehyksessä julkisesti saatavilla olevien yhteisvertailutietojen suuresta määrästä; ja (3) sääntöihin perustuviin ratkaisijoihin koodatun aikaisemman tiedon integrointi. Lähestymistapamme tuottaa huippuluokan tuloksia kolmella vakioarviointikorpusella.', 'jv': 'We test the amount to that super Vised Bridge Resolutiones can be refreshed unaffirming additional etiketed Bridge data by proposal a rome limited multi-task Learning frame for Bridge Resolution, in whose we (1) design inter-task konordinance limits to guide the Learning Procedure; (2) Ngabah-luwih akeh sistem sing dibutuhke Entire karo sistem multi-task nang daftar nggawe Perintah penting nggawe (3) Senegal perusahaan kelas nang angkang dipoleh Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasakno-perusahaan tanggal telu banjuré.', 'he': 'אנו בודקים את המידה שבה אפשר לשפר את המפתחים של הגשר המבוטחים מבלי להשתמש בנתונים של הגשר המתווידים נוספים על ידי להציע מסגרת לימוד מוגבלת חדשה ללמוד במשימות רבות לרזולוציה של הגשר, שבה אנחנו (1) מעצבים מגבלות התקבלות של המשימה הצלבית כדי להדריך את תהליך הלימוד; (2) להתאמן מראש את דוגמא התאמה של היחידה במסגרת המשימות רבות על כמות גדולה של נתוני התאמה זמינים לציבור; (3) לשתף ידע קודם מקודם מקודם בפתרונים מבוססים על חוקים. הגישה שלנו משיגה תוצאות חדשות על שלושה גופות עריכה סטנדרטיות.', 'sk': 'Preučujemo obseg, v katerem je mogoče nadzorovane reševalce premostitve izboljšati brez uporabe dodatnih označenih premostitvenih podatkov s predlogom novega omejenega večopravilnega učnega okvira za premostitveno reševanje, znotraj katerega (1) oblikujemo omejitve medopravilne doslednosti za usmerjanje učnega procesa; (2) predusposabljanje modela korreference subjekta v okviru večnalog o velikem številu javno dostopnih podatkov o korreferenci; in (3) vključevanje predhodnega znanja, kodiranega v reševalce, ki temeljijo na pravilih. Naš pristop dosega najsodobnejše rezultate na treh standardnih vrednotenjskih korpusih.', 'ha': "Tuna jarraba gwargwadon da za'a samar da masu fassarar biriki ko kuma ba a yi amfani da wasu data na tabalin daraja ba da kuma a buƙata wani noveli wanda aka riƙe firam masu sanar wa masu aikin da mulki-aikin da aka riƙe wa rabo-rabo, a cikinsa (1) za'a ƙayyade taƙaitũniya mai adadi ga aikin da za'a shirya aikin karanta; (2) pre-train the entity coreference model in the multi-task framework on the large amount of publicly available coreference data;  kuma ta haɗa a gabãnin wani ilmi wanda aka samu a cikin masu karkacin sarayyar. MataimakinMu na sami matsalar-halin-sanata a kan makampuni matabbata.", 'bo': 'We examine the extent to which supervised bridging resolvers can be improved without employing additional labeled bridging data by proposing a novel constrained multi-task learning framework for bridging resolution, within which we (1) design cross-task consistency constraints to guide the learning process; and (2) སྤྱི་ཚོགས་མང་ཆེ་བའི་མཐུན་རྣམས་ལྡན་པའི་དབུགས་ཆ་གཙོ་ཅན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་མིང་། (3) སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་མི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་གིས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཙོ་རིམ་བཟོས་མཁན་གསུམ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'How Do We Answer Complex Questions: Discourse Structure of Long-form Answers', 'ar': 'DEAM: تقييم تماسك الحوار باستخدام التلاعبات الدلالية القائمة على AMR', 'es': 'DEAM: Evaluación de la coherencia del diálogo mediante manipulaciones semánticas basadas en AMR', 'pt': 'DEAM: Avaliação de Coerência de Diálogo usando Manipulações Semânticas baseadas em AMR', 'fr': "DEAM\xa0: Évaluation de la cohérence du dialogue à l'aide de manipulations sémantiques basées sur l'", 'ja': 'DEAM ： AMRベースのセマンティック操作を使用したダイアログコヒーレンス評価', 'zh': 'DEAM:用 AMR 语义贞一致性评', 'hi': 'DEAM: संवाद सुसंगतता मूल्यांकन AMR-आधारित शब्दार्थ जोड़तोड़ का उपयोग कर', 'ru': 'DEAM: Оценка согласованности диалога с использованием семантических манипуляций на основе АМР', 'ga': 'DEAM: Measúnú Comhtháthaithe Idirphlé ag baint úsáide as Ionramhálacha Séimeantacha bunaithe ar AMR', 'el': 'DEAM: Αξιολόγηση Συνοχής Διαλόγων χρησιμοποιώντας Σημαντικούς Χειρισμούς βασισμένους στην ΑΜR', 'hu': 'DEAM: A párbeszéd koherenciájának értékelése AMR-alapú szemantikus manipulációkkal', 'ka': 'DEAM: დიალოგის კოჰენერეციის განსაზღვრება AMR-ის სემანტიკური მანიპულაციების გამოყენება', 'kk': 'DEAM: AMR- негіздеген семантикалық манипулацияларды қолданып диалогтың координациясын бағалау', 'it': 'DEAM: Valutazione della coerenza del dialogo utilizzando manipolazioni semantiche basate su AMR', 'lt': 'DEAM: Dialogo nuoseklumo vertinimas naudojant AMR pagrįstus semantinius manipuliacijas', 'mk': 'ДИАМ: Проценка на коеренцијата на дијалогот користејќи семантични манипулации базирани на AMR', 'mn': 'DEAM: АМР-д суурилсан Semantic Manipulations ашиглан диалогын соглалцооны үнэлгээ', 'ms': 'DEAM: Evaluasi Kesesuaian Dialog menggunakan Manipulasi Seman Berasas AMR', 'ml': 'DEAM: AMR-അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് മാനിപ്പുലേഷനുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് കോഹെറെന്\u200dസ് വിവരണം', 'mt': 'DEAM: Evalwazzjoni ta’ Koerenza tad-Djalogu bl-użu ta’ Manipulazzjonijiet Semantiċi bbażati fuq AMR', 'pl': 'DEAM: Ocena spójności dialogu z wykorzystaniem manipulacji semantycznych opartych na AMR', 'ro': 'DEAM: Evaluarea coerenței dialogului folosind manipulări semantice bazate pe AMR', 'sr': 'DEAM: Evaluacija koherencije dijaloga koristeći semantičke manipulacije na AMR-u', 'no': 'DEAM: Evaluering av dialogkoherens ved bruk av AMR-basert semiantiske manipulasjonar', 'so': 'DEAM: Heyminta ku saabsan qoraalka kooherence using AMR-based Semantic Manipulations', 'si': 'DEAM: AMR- ආධාරිත සැමැන්තික විදිහට භාවිත කරන්න සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය', 'sv': 'DEAM: Dialogkoherens utvärdering med hjälp av AMR-baserade semantiska manipulationer', 'ta': 'DEAM: AMR- அடிப்படையான செமாண்டிக் கையாளங்களை பயன்படுத்தி உரையாடல் கூட்டு மதிப்பு', 'ur': 'DEAM: AMR-based Semantic Manipulations using Dialogue Coherence Evaluation', 'uz': 'DEAM: AMR asosida yaratilgan dialog koʻpaytirish', 'vi': 'Giải quyết liên quan đối thoại dựa trên thuyết động kỳ diệu', 'bg': 'Оценка на съгласуваността на диалога с помощта на семантични манипулации, базирани на АМР', 'nl': 'DEAM: Evaluatie van dialoogcoherentie met behulp van AMR-gebaseerde semantische manipulaties', 'de': 'DEAM: Dialogkohärenzbewertung mittels AMR-basierter semantischer Manipulationen', 'ko': 'DEAM: AMR 의미 조작에 기반한 대화의 일관성 평가', 'da': 'DEAM: Dialogkohærens evaluering ved hjælp af AMR-baserede semantiske manipulationer', 'hr': 'DEAM: Evaluacija koherencije dijaloga koristeći semantičke manipulacije na temelju AMR-a', 'fa': 'DEAM: ارزیابی هماهنگی محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ با استفاده از تغییرات سیمانتیک بر اساس AMR', 'id': 'DEAM: Evaluasi Koerensi Dialog menggunakan Manipulasi Seman Berdasarkan AMR', 'sw': 'DEAM: Uthibitisho wa Ujasusi wa Dialogue kwa kutumia Manipulations based on AMR', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'tr': 'DEAM: AMR tabanly Semantik Manipulasyony ulanarak Dialog Taýýarlama', 'hy': 'DEAM: Dialogue Coherence Evaluation using AMR-based Semantic Manipulations', 'sq': 'DEAM: Vlerësimi i Koerencës së Dialogut duke përdorur Manipulacionet Semantike me bazë në AMR', 'bn': 'DEAM: AMR ভিত্তিক সেমান্টিক ম্যানিপুলেশন ব্যবহার করে ডায়ালগ কোয়েরেন্স মূল্যায়ন', 'bs': 'DEAM: Evaluacija koherencije dijaloga koristeći semantičke manipulacije na temelju AMR-a', 'ca': 'DEAM: Evaluació de la coerència del diàleg utilitzant manipulacions Semàntiques basades en AMR', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'et': 'DEAM: Dialoogi sidususe hindamine AMR-il põhinevate semantiliste manipulatsioonide abil', 'az': 'DEAM: AMR tabanlı Semantik Manipulasyonları vasitəsilə Dialog Coherence Evaluasyonu', 'fi': 'DEAM: Dialogue Coherence Evaluation using AMR-based Semantic Manipulations', 'cs': 'DEAM: Hodnocení soudržnosti dialogu pomocí sémantických manipulací založených na AMR', 'he': 'שימוש בהערכה התקבלות בשימוש במניפולים סמנטיים מבוססים על AMR', 'ha': 'DAAM: Taimar Dialog na Kyaushe da ake amfani da AMR-based Semantic Manipulations', 'sk': 'DEAM: Ocena skladnosti dialoga s semantičnimi manipulacijami, ki temeljijo na AMR', 'jv': 'DEAM: Dialog coherence invaluation usang AM-basa semanti Manipulations', 'bo': 'DEAM: Dialogue Coherence Evaluation using AMR-based Semantic Manipulations'}
{'en': 'Long-form answers, consisting of multiple sentences, can provide nuanced and comprehensive answers to a broader set of questions. To better understand this complex and understudied task, we study the functional structure of long-form answers collected from three datasets, ELI5, WebGPT and Natural Questions. Our main goal is to understand how humans organize information to craft complex answers. We develop an ontology of six sentence-level functional roles for long-form answers, and annotate 3.9k sentences in 640 answer paragraphs. Different answer collection methods manifest in different discourse structures. We further analyze model-generated answers – finding that annotators agree less with each other when annotating model-generated answers compared to annotating human-written answers. Our annotated data enables training a strong classifier that can be used for automatic analysis. We hope our work can inspire future research on discourse-level modeling and evaluation of long-form QA systems.', 'ar': 'تعد مقاييس التقييم التلقائية ضرورية للتطوير السريع لأنظمة حوار المجال المفتوح لأنها تسهل ضبط المعلمات الفائقة والمقارنة بين النماذج. على الرغم من أن مقاييس مستوى المحادثة القابلة للتدريب المقترحة مؤخرًا أظهرت نتائج مشجعة ، إلا أن جودة المقاييس تعتمد بشدة على جودة بيانات التدريب.\nتلجأ الأعمال السابقة بشكل أساسي إلى التلاعب بمستوى النص الاستدلالى (مثل خلط الكلام) لتمهيد المحادثات غير المتماسكة (الأمثلة السلبية) من الحوارات المتماسكة (الأمثلة الإيجابية). هذه الأساليب غير كافية لتعكس بشكل مناسب عدم الترابط الذي يحدث في التفاعلات بين نماذج الحوار المتقدمة والبشر.\nلمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح DEAM ، a \\ تسطير {D} éalogue coherence \\ underline {E} مقياس تقييم يعتمد على \\ underline {A} b abstract معنى التمثيل (AMR) لتطبيق semantic-level \\ underline {M} anipulations من أجل توليد البيانات غير المتماسكة (السلبية). تسهل AMR بشكل طبيعي حقن أنواع مختلفة من مصادر عدم الاتساق ، مثل التناقض المرجعي ، وعدم الأهمية ، والتناقضات ، وتقليل المشاركة ، على المستوى الدلالي ، مما يؤدي إلى عينات غير متماسكة أكثر طبيعية. تظهر تجاربنا أن DEAM تحقق ارتباطات أعلى مع الأحكام البشرية مقارنة بأساليب خط الأساس في العديد من مجموعات بيانات الحوار بهوامش كبيرة. نظهر أيضًا أن DEAM يمكنه التمييز بين الحوارات المتماسكة وغير المتماسكة الناتجة عن التلاعب الأساسي ، في حين أن تلك\nلا تستطيع النماذج الأساسية اكتشاف الأمثلة غير المتماسكة التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة DEAM. توضح نتائجنا إمكانات المعالجات الدلالية القائمة على AMR لتوليد الأمثلة السلبية الطبيعية.', 'es': 'Las métricas de evaluación automática son esenciales para el rápido desarrollo de sistemas de diálogo de dominio abierto, ya que facilitan el ajuste de hiperparámetros y la comparación entre modelos. Aunque las métricas de nivel de conversación que se han propuesto recientemente han mostrado resultados alentadores, la calidad de las métricas depende en gran medida de la calidad de los datos de entrenamiento. \nLos trabajos anteriores recurren principalmente a manipulaciones heurísticas a nivel de texto (por ejemplo, mezcla de enunciados) para iniciar conversaciones incoherentes (ejemplos negativos) a partir de diálogos coherentes (ejemplos positivos). Tales enfoques son insuficientes para reflejar adecuadamente la incoherencia que se produce en las interacciones entre los modelos de diálogo avanzados y los seres humanos. \nPara abordar este problema, proponemos DEAM, una métrica de valoración de\\ underline {D} coherencia del diálogo\\ underline {E} que se basa en\\ underline {A} bstract Meaning Representation (AMR) para aplicar manipulaciones semánticas\\ underline {M} para la generación de datos incoherentes (negativos). Los AMR facilitan naturalmente la inyección de varios tipos de fuentes de incoherencia, como la inconsistencia de correferencia, la irrelevancia, las contradicciones y la disminución del compromiso, a nivel semántico, lo que resulta en muestras incoherentes más naturales. Nuestros experimentos muestran que la DEAM logra correlaciones más altas con los juicios humanos en comparación con los métodos de referencia en varios conjuntos de datos de diálogo por márgenes significativos. También mostramos que DEAM puede distinguir entre diálogos coherentes e incoherentes generados por manipulaciones de línea base, mientras que aquellos\nlos modelos de referencia no pueden detectar ejemplos incoherentes generados por DEAM. Nuestros resultados demuestran el potencial de las manipulaciones semánticas basadas en AMR para la generación de ejemplos negativos naturales.', 'pt': 'Métricas de avaliação automática são essenciais para o rápido desenvolvimento de sistemas de diálogo de domínio aberto, pois facilitam o ajuste de hiperparâmetros e a comparação entre modelos. Embora as métricas de nível de conversação recentemente propostas tenham mostrado resultados encorajadores, a qualidade das métricas é fortemente dependente da qualidade dos dados de treinamento.\nTrabalhos anteriores recorrem principalmente a manipulações heurísticas em nível de texto (por exemplo, embaralhamento de enunciados) para iniciar conversas incoerentes (exemplos negativos) de diálogos coerentes (exemplos positivos). Tais abordagens são insuficientes para refletir adequadamente a incoerência que ocorre nas interações entre modelos avançados de diálogo e humanos.\nPara resolver este problema, propomos DEAM, uma \\underline{D}coerência de diálogo \\underline{E}métrica de avaliação que se baseia em \\underline{A}representação de significado abstrato (AMR) para aplicar \\underline{M}anipulações de nível semântico para geração de dados incoerentes (negativos). Os AMRs naturalmente facilitam a injeção de vários tipos de fontes de incoerência, como inconsistência de correferência, irrelevância, contradições e diminuição do engajamento, no nível semântico, resultando em amostras incoerentes mais naturais. Nossos experimentos mostram que o DEAM alcança correlações mais altas com julgamentos humanos em comparação com métodos de linha de base em vários conjuntos de dados de diálogo por margens significativas. Mostramos também que o DEAM pode distinguir entre diálogos coerentes e incoerentes gerados por manipulações de linha de base, enquanto aqueles\nmodelos de linha de base não podem detectar exemplos incoerentes gerados pelo DEAM. Nossos resultados demonstram o potencial de manipulações semânticas baseadas em AMR para geração de exemplos negativos naturais.', 'fr': "Les métriques d'évaluation automatiques sont essentielles pour le développement rapide de systèmes de dialogue de domaine ouvert, car elles facilitent le réglage des hyperparamètres et la comparaison entre les modèles. Bien que les mesures de niveau conversation pouvant être entraînées récemment proposées aient donné des résultats encourageants, la qualité des mesures dépend fortement de la qualité des données d'entraînement. \nLes travaux antérieurs ont principalement recours à des manipulations heuristiques au niveau du texte (par exemple, mélange d'énoncés) pour amorcer des conversations incohérentes (exemples négatifs) à partir de dialogues cohérents (exemples positifs). De telles approches sont insuffisantes pour refléter de manière appropriée l'incohérence qui se produit dans les interactions entre les modèles de dialogue avancés et les humains. \nPour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons DEAM, une métrique de valorisation\xa0\\ underline {D} cohérence de dialogue\xa0\\ underline {E} qui repose sur\xa0\\ underline {A} représentation de signification abstraite (AMR) pour appliquer des manipulations de niveau sémantique\xa0\\ underline {M} pour la génération de données incohérentes (négatives). Les RAM facilitent naturellement l'injection de divers types de sources d'incohérence, telles que l'incohérence de coréférence, la non-pertinence, les contradictions, et diminuent l'engagement, au niveau sémantique, résultant ainsi en des échantillons incohérents plus naturels. Nos expériences montrent que la DEAM permet d'obtenir des corrélations plus élevées avec les jugements humains par rapport aux méthodes de base sur plusieurs ensembles de données de dialogue avec des marges significatives. Nous montrons également que DEAM peut faire la distinction entre des dialogues cohérents et incohérents générés par des manipulations de base, alors que\nles modèles de référence ne peuvent pas détecter d'exemples incohérents générés par la DEAM. Nos résultats démontrent le potentiel des manipulations sémantiques basées sur l'AMR pour la génération d'exemples naturels négatifs.", 'ja': '自動評価メトリックは、ハイパーパラメータのチューニングとモデル間の比較を容易にするため、オープンドメイン対話システムの急速な発展に不可欠です。 最近提案されたトレーニング可能な会話レベルの指標は、興味深い結果を示していますが、指標の質はトレーニングデータの質に大きく依存しています。 \n以前の研究では、主にヒューリスティックなテキストレベルの操作（発話のシャッフルなど）を用いて、一貫性のある対話（肯定的な例）から一貫性のない会話（否定的な例）をブートストラップする。 このようなアプローチは、高度な対話モデルと人間との間の相互作用で生じる不整合を適切に反映するには不十分である。 \nこの問題に対処するために、DEAMを提案します。DEAMは\\アンダーライン{D}対話の一貫性\\アンダーライン{E}評価指標で、\\アンダーライン{A}抽象意味表現（ AMR ）に依存して、セマンティックレベルの\\アンダーライン{M}操作を不整合（ネガティブ）データ生成に適用します。 ＡＭＲは、セマンティックレベルで、コアレフィケーションの不整合性、無関係性、矛盾、及びエンゲージメントの減少などの様々なタイプの不整合源の注入を自然に促進し、したがって、より自然な不整合サンプルをもたらす。 私たちの実験では、DEAMは、いくつかのダイアログデータセットのベースライン法と比較して、有意なマージンで人間の判断とのより高い相関を達成することが示されています。 また、DEAMは、ベースライン操作によって生成された一貫性のある対話と一貫性のない対話を区別できることを示しています。\nベースラインモデルは、DEAMによって生成された不整合な例を検出できない。私たちの結果は、AMRベースのセマンティック操作が自然なネガティブサンプル生成の可能性を示しています。', 'zh': '自料指标于开放域之速发至要,盖助模形之超参数调比也。 虽近言可教会话级指标见令人鼓舞之效,然指标之量,决于练数之量。 \n前文大抵诉诸启发式文本级操作(如言洗牌)以引贯对(负面示例)不连贯对(负面示例)。 此术不足以当上不连贯性。 \n为此者,举而DEAM之,一\\underline{D}ialogue coherentence \\underline{E}valuation metric赖之。\\underline{A}bstract Meaning Representation(AMR)以语义级\\underline{M}动画生不连贯(负)数。 AMR自有助于语义级注各种类型之不连贯源,如核心不一,不相关,矛盾损参与度,以至于不连贯样本。 臣等实验明,比基线之法,DEAM数对集上遂得其相关性。 又明DEAM可分基线生连非连贯之对。\n基线模不可检 DEAM 生成不连贯示例。 考之以AMR语义操作于自然负面示例生成之力。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स ओपन-डोमेन संवाद प्रणालियों के तेजी से विकास के लिए आवश्यक हैं क्योंकि वे हाइपर-पैरामीटर ट्यूनिंग और मॉडल के बीच तुलना की सुविधा प्रदान करते हैं। हालांकि हाल ही में प्रस्तावित प्रशिक्षित वार्तालाप-स्तर मैट्रिक्स ने उत्साहजनक परिणाम दिखाए हैं, मीट्रिक की गुणवत्ता प्रशिक्षण डेटा की गुणवत्ता पर दृढ़ता से निर्भर करती है। \nपूर्व कार्य मुख्य रूप से सुसंगत संवादों (सकारात्मक उदाहरणों) से असंगत वार्तालापों (नकारात्मक उदाहरणों) को बूटस्ट्रैप करने के लिए हेरिस्टिक टेक्स्ट-लेवल जोड़तोड़ (जैसे उच्चारण फेरबदल) का सहारा लेते हैं। इस तरह के दृष्टिकोण उचित रूप से असंगतता को प्रतिबिंबित करने के लिए अपर्याप्त हैं जो उन्नत संवाद मॉडल और मनुष्यों के बीच बातचीत में होता है। \nइस समस्या से निपटने के लिए, हम DEAM का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक \\underline{D}ialogue coherence \\underline{E}मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक जो असंगत (नकारात्मक) डेटा पीढ़ी के लिए शब्दार्थ-स्तर \\underline{M}anipulations लागू करने के लिए \\underline{A}bstract अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (AMR) पर निर्भर करता है। एएमआर स्वाभाविक रूप से विभिन्न प्रकार के असंगति स्रोतों के इंजेक्शन की सुविधा प्रदान करते हैं, जैसे कि शब्दार्थ स्तर पर कोरेफेरेंस असंगतता, अप्रासंगिकता, विरोधाभास, और सगाई में कमी, इस प्रकार अधिक प्राकृतिक असंगत नमूने होते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि डीईएएम महत्वपूर्ण मार्जिन द्वारा कई संवाद डेटासेट पर बेसलाइन विधियों की तुलना में मानव निर्णय के साथ उच्च सहसंबंध प्राप्त करता है। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि डीईएएम बेसलाइन जोड़तोड़ द्वारा उत्पन्न सुसंगत और असंगत संवादों के बीच अंतर कर सकता है, जबकि उन\nबेसलाइन मॉडल DEAM द्वारा उत्पन्न असंगत उदाहरणों का पता नहीं लगा सकता है। हमारे परिणाम प्राकृतिक नकारात्मक उदाहरण पीढ़ी के लिए एएमआर-आधारित शब्दार्थ जोड़तोड़ की क्षमता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Автоматические метрики оценки имеют важное значение для быстрого развития систем открытого диалога, поскольку они облегчают настройку гиперпараметров и сравнение между моделями. Хотя недавно предложенные обучаемые метрики на уровне разговора показали обнадеживающие результаты, качество метрик сильно зависит от качества данных обучения. \nПредыдущие работы в основном прибегают к эвристическим манипуляциям на уровне текста (например, перетасовка высказываний), чтобы загрузить некогерентные разговоры (отрицательные примеры) из когерентных диалогов (положительные примеры). Такие подходы недостаточны для того, чтобы надлежащим образом отразить несогласованность, которая имеет место во взаимодействии между передовыми моделями диалога и людьми. \nДля решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем DEAM, метрику оценки\\underline{D} Dialogue coherence \\underline{E}, которая опирается на \\underline{A} bstract Meaning Representation (AMR) для применения семантических\\underline{M}анипуляций для генерации некогерентных (отрицательных) данных. AMR, естественно, облегчают введение различных типов источников несогласованности, таких как несогласованность ядра, нерелевантность, противоречия и снижение вовлеченности на семантическом уровне, что приводит к более естественным несогласованным выборкам. Наши эксперименты показывают, что DEAM достигает более высоких корреляций с оценками человека по сравнению с базовыми методами на нескольких диалоговых наборах данных со значительными пределами. Мы также показываем, что DEAM может различать последовательные и несогласованные диалоги, генерируемые базовыми манипуляциями, в то время как эти\nбазовые модели не могут обнаружить несогласованные примеры, генерируемые DEAM. Наши результаты демонстрируют потенциал семантических манипуляций на основе AMR для генерации естественных отрицательных примеров.', 'ga': 'Tá méadracht mheastóireachta uathoibríoch riachtanach chun córais idirphlé fearainn oscailte a fhorbairt go mear toisc go n-éascaíonn siad tiúnadh hipearpharaiméadair agus comparáid idir samhlacha. Cé gur léirigh méadracht leibhéal an chomhrá in oiliúint a moladh le déanaí torthaí spreagúla, tá cáilíocht na méadrachta ag brath go mór ar cháilíocht na sonraí oiliúna.\nBaineann saothair roimhe seo go príomha le hionramhálacha heorastúla ar leibhéal an téacs (m.sh. suaitheadh cainte) chun comhráite neamhchomhleanúnacha (samplaí diúltacha) a bhrú ó chomhphlé comhleanúnach (samplaí dearfacha). Ní leor cur chuige den sórt sin chun an neamhchomhleanúnachas a tharlaíonn in idirghníomhaíochtaí idir samhlacha ardphlé agus daoine a léiriú go hiomchuí.\nChun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo, molaimid DEAM, \\underline{D}comhchuibheas idirphlé \\underline{E}méadrach luachála a bhraitheann ar \\underline{A}Léiriú Brí Brí an Bharla (AMR) chun ionramhálacha ar leibhéal séimeantach \\folíne{M} a chur i bhfeidhm do giniúint sonraí neamhchomhleanúnach (diúltach). Éascaíonn AMBanna go nádúrtha instealladh cineálacha éagsúla foinsí neamhchomhleanúnacha, mar neamh-chomhsheasmhacht croí-chomhsheasmhachta, neamh-ábharthacht, contrárthachtaí, agus laghdaítear rannpháirtíocht, ag an leibhéal shéimeantach, rud a fhágann go mbíonn samplaí neamhchomhleanúnacha níos nádúrtha mar thoradh air. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go mbaineann DEAM comhghaolta níos airde amach le breithiúnais dhaonna i gcomparáid le modhanna bonnlíne ar roinnt tacar sonraí dialóige le corrlaigh shuntasacha. Léirímid freisin gur féidir le DEAM idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir idirphlé comhleanúnach agus neamhchomhleanúnach a ghintear trí ionramhálacha bonnlíne, ach iad siúd\nní féidir le samhlacha bunlíne samplaí neamhchomhleanúnacha ginte ag DEAM a bhrath. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí an acmhainneacht atá le hionramhálacha shéimeantacha bunaithe ar AMR chun samplaí diúltacha nádúrtha a ghiniúint.', 'ka': 'ბაზლინის მოდელები არ შეიძლება DEAM-ის შექმნილი არსებობი მაგალითების განსახულება. ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ევმჲჟრთპაარ ოჲნვუთალნჲრ ჟვმანრთფნთ მანთოსლსუთთ ჱა ნაპჲენთრვ ნვრთდთგთ ოპთმვპთ.', 'it': 'I modelli di base non possono rilevare esempi incoerenti generati da DEAM. I nostri risultati dimostrano il potenziale delle manipolazioni semantiche basate su AMR per la generazione di esempi negativi naturali.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα βάσης δεν μπορούν να ανιχνεύσουν ασυνάρτητα παραδείγματα που παράγονται από το DEAM. Τα αποτελέσματά μας καταδεικνύουν τις δυνατότητες σημασιολογικών χειρισμών βασισμένων στην ΑΜR για φυσική παραγωγή αρνητικών παραδειγμάτων.', 'hu': 'Az alapvető modellek nem tudják felismerni a DEAM által generált inkoherens példákat. Eredményeink bemutatják az AMR alapú szemantikai manipulációk potenciálját a természetes negatív példa generálására.', 'lt': 'pradiniai modeliai negali nustatyti nesuderinamų DEAM pavyzdžių. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad gamtinės neigiamos kartos semantiniai manipuliavimai gali būti pagrįsti AMR.', 'ms': 'model dasar tidak dapat mengesan contoh tidak konsisten yang dijana oleh DEAM. Our results demonstrate the potential of AMR-based semantic manipulations for natural negative example generation.', 'ml': 'ഡെയാഎം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്ന ഉപമകള്\u200d ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d AMR-അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് കൈകാര്യം കാണിക്കുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവികമായ നെറ്റിവ് തലമ', 'kk': 'негізгі үлгілер DEAM құрылған мәселелерді таба алмайды. Біздің нәтижелеріміз AMR негізгі симантикалық манипулацияларының мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'основните модели не можат да откријат несогласни примери генерирани од DEAM. Our results demonstrate the potential of AMR-based semantic manipulations for natural negative example generation.', 'mt': 'mudelli ta’ linja bażi ma jistgħux jidentifikaw eżempji inkoerenti ġġenerati mid-DEAM. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru l-potenzjal ta’ manipulazzjonijiet semantiċi bbażati fuq AMR għal ġenerazzjoni ta’ eżempji negattivi naturali.', 'mn': 'суурь шугам загварууд ДЕАМ-ын үүсгэсэн олон жишээг олж чадахгүй. Бидний үр дүнд АМР-ын суурилсан semantic manipulation боломжтой байгалийн сөрөг жишээний үеийн талаар харуулдаг.', 'no': 'baseline-modeller kan ikkje finna ulike eksemplar laga av DEAM. Resultatet våre viser potensialen av AMR-baserte semantiske manipulasjonar for naturlig negative eksempel.', 'pl': 'Modele bazowe nie mogą wykryć niespójnych przykładów generowanych przez DEAM. Nasze wyniki demonstrują potencjał manipulacji semantycznych opartych na AMR dla naturalnego generowania negatywnego przykładu.', 'ro': 'Modelele de bază nu pot detecta exemple incoerente generate de DEAM. Rezultatele noastre demonstrează potențialul manipulărilor semantice bazate pe AMR pentru generarea exemplelor negative naturale.', 'sr': 'osnovni modeli ne mogu otkriti neobične primjere koje su proizveli DEAM. Naši rezultati pokazuju potencijal semantičkih manipulacija na AMR-u za prirodnu negativnu generaciju primjera.', 'si': 'DEAM වලින් නිර්මාණය කරපු නිර්මාණයක් හොයාගන්න බෑ. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ AMR-අධාරිත සැමැන්තික විදිහට සාමාන්තික විදිහට සාමාන්තික විදිහට', 'so': 'Tusaalada aasaasiga ah ma ogaan karo tusaalooyin nololeed oo soo dhashay DEAM. Abaalkeena waxay muujiyaan awoodda AMR-ku saleysan qayb-ka ah tusaale ahaan qarniga dabiicadda ah.', 'sv': 'baslinjemodeller kan inte upptäcka inkonsekventa exempel som genereras av DEAM. Våra resultat visar potentialen hos AMR-baserade semantiska manipulationer för naturlig negativ exempelgenerering.', 'ta': 'அடிப்படைக்கோடு மாதிரிகள் DEAM உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உதாரணங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியாது. நம்முடைய முடிவுகள் AMR-அடிப்படையில் இருந்து அமைப்பு நிர்வாக்கத்தை காண்பிக்கிறது இயற்கையான எதிர்மம் தல', 'ur': 'بنیس لین موڈل DEAM کے ذریعہ پیدا کئے ہوئے مختلف مثالیں نہیں پاسکتے۔ ہمارے نتیجے AMR-based semantic manipulations کی امکانات دکھاتے ہیں طبیعی منفی مثال نسل کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Uzunasi Bizning natijalarimiz AMR asosida semantik boshqaruvchilarini tabiiy negativ foydalanish uchun qo'llanmalarni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'cơ sở mẫu không thể phát hiện trường hợp đồng tạo ra bởi CHẾT. Những kết quả của chúng ta đã chứng minh tiềm năng của sự thao túng theo dạng chữ nghĩa AMR cho thế hệ thí dụ tiêu cực.', 'nl': 'basislijnmodellen kunnen incoherende voorbeelden die door DEAM zijn gegenereerd, niet detecteren. Onze resultaten tonen het potentieel aan van AMR-gebaseerde semantische manipulaties voor natuurlijke negatieve voorbeeldgeneratie.', 'de': 'Basismodelle können inkohärente Beispiele, die von DEAM generiert wurden, nicht erkennen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen das Potenzial von AMR-basierten semantischen Manipulationen für die natürliche negative Beispielgenerierung.', 'bg': 'базовите модели не могат да откриват несъответствия, генерирани от DEAM. Нашите резултати демонстрират потенциала на базираните на АМР семантични манипулации за генериране на естествени негативни примери.', 'hr': 'početni modeli ne mogu otkriti neobične primjere koje su proizveli DEAM. Naši rezultati pokazuju potencijal semantičkih manipulacija na temelju AMR-a prirodne negativne generacije primjera.', 'da': 'baseline-modeller kan ikke registrere inkonsekvente eksempler genereret af DEAM. Vores resultater demonstrerer potentialet ved AMR-baserede semantiske manipulationer for naturlig negativ eksempel generering.', 'id': 'model dasar tidak dapat mendeteksi contoh yang tidak konsisten yang dibuat oleh DEAM. Hasil kami menunjukkan potensi dari manipulasi semantis berdasarkan AMR untuk generasi contoh negatif alam.', 'ko': '베이스라인 모델은 DEAM에서 생성된 일관성 없는 예제를 감지할 수 없습니다.우리의 결과는 AMR의 의미 조작을 바탕으로 자연의 부정적인 예시가 생성하는 잠재력을 증명했다.', 'sq': 'modelet bazë nuk mund të zbulojnë shembuj të panjohur të gjeneruar nga DEAM. Our results demonstrate the potential of AMR-based semantic manipulations for natural negative example generation.', 'am': 'baseline models cannot detect incoherent examples generated by DEAM.  ፍሬዎቻችን የAMR-based semantic manipulations ለፍጥረታዊ negative ትውልድ ምሳሌ ያሳያል፡፡', 'sw': 'Mradi wa msingi hauwezi kugundua mifano yoyote iliyotengenezwa na DEAM. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha uwezekano wa udhibiti wa kimapenzi wa AMR kwa mfano asili.', 'tr': 'süýşik nusgalary DEAM tarapyndan döredilen çykyp bilmeýär Bizim netijelerimiz AMR tabanlı semantik işlemlerinin doğal negatif örnek döredilmesi üçin potansiyelini gösteriyor.', 'az': 'dəyişiklik modelləri DEAM tarafından ürəklənmiş müxtəlif məsəlləri tanıma bilmir. Bizim sonuçlarımız AMR tabanlı semantik manipulların doğal negatif nümunə nəsillərinin potensialını göstərir.', 'af': 'baseline modelle kan nie onderskryf inkoherende voorbeelde wat deur DEAM genereer word nie. Ons resultate wys die potensiele van AMR-gebaseerde semantiese manipulasies vir natuurlike negatiewe voorbeeld generasie.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط نمی\u200cتوانند مثال\u200cهای مختلف را که توسط DEAM تولید می\u200cکنند شناسایی کنند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما پتانسیل تغییرات semantic based on AMR را برای نسل مثال منفی طبیعی نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'bn': 'বেসালাইন মডেল ডিফল্ট ডিএম তৈরি করা আবর্তিক উদাহরণ সনাক্ত করতে পারে না। আমাদের ফলাফল প্রকাশ করে প্রাকৃতিক নেতিবাচক প্রজন্মের জন্য এমআর-ভিত্তিক সেম্যান্টিক প্রমাণিত করার সম্ভাবনা।', 'bs': 'osnovni modeli ne mogu otkriti neobične primjere koje su proizveli DEAM. Naši rezultati pokazuju potencijal semantičkih manipulacija na AMR-u za prirodnu negativnu generaciju primjera.', 'ca': 'els models de base no poden detectar exemples incoherents generats per DEAM. Our results demonstrate the potential of AMR-based semantic manipulations for natural negative example generation.', 'et': 'baasmudelid ei suuda tuvastada DEAM-i loodud ebaühtseid näiteid. Meie tulemused näitavad AMR-põhiste semantiliste manipulatsioonide potentsiaali loomuliku negatiivse näite genereerimiseks.', 'hy': 'baseline models cannot detect incoherent examples generated by DEAM.  Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս ԱՄՌ-ի հիմնված սեմանատիկ մանիպլացիաների պոտենցիալը բնական բացասական սերունդների համար:', 'fi': 'Perusmallit eivät pysty havaitsemaan DEAM:n tuottamia epäjohdonmukaisia esimerkkejä. Tuloksemme osoittavat AMR-pohjaisten semanttisten manipulaatioiden potentiaalin luonnollisen negatiivisen esimerkin tuottamiseen.', 'cs': 'základní modely nemohou detekovat nekonzistentní příklady generované DEAM. Naše výsledky ukazují potenciál sémantických manipulací založených na AMR pro přirozené generování negativních příkladů.', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Rejalaké awak dhéwé éntukno ngerasakno kapan kelangan semanti sing basa gambar gambar barang nggawe barang dhéwé kuwi wis ngerasakno.', 'he': 'מודלים בסיסיים לא יכולים לגלות דוגמאות לא תואמות שנוצרות על ידי DEAM. Our results demonstrate the potential of AMR-based semantic manipulations for natural negative example generation.', 'sk': 'osnovni modeli ne morejo zaznati neskladnih primerov, ki jih ustvari DEAM. Naši rezultati kažejo potencial semantičnih manipulacij na osnovi AMR za generiranje naravnih negativnih primerov.', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis MatamayinMu na nuna awon maniki na AMR-da aka baka na semantiki kamar misali na negar.', 'bo': 'baseline models cannot detect incoherent examples generated by DEAM. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག'}
{'en': 'ConditionalQA A Complex Reading Comprehension Dataset with Conditional Answers', 'ar': 'HIBRIDS: الانتباه مع التحيزات الهرمية لتلخيص المستندات الطويلة المدرك للهيكل', 'pt': 'HÍBRIDOS: Atenção com vieses hierárquicos para sumarização de documentos longos com reconhecimento de estrutura', 'fr': 'HIBRIDS\xa0: attention aux biais hiérarchiques pour la synthèse de documents longs tenant compte de la structure', 'es': 'HIBRIDS: Atención con sesgos jerárquicos para el resumen de documentos largos con conciencia de la estructura', 'ja': 'HIBRIDS ：構造を認識した長い文書の要約のための階層的バイアスへの注意', 'zh': 'HIBRIDS:注意偏文档摘要', 'ru': 'HIBRIDS: Внимание с иерархическими предубеждениями для структурированного резюмирования длинных документов', 'hi': 'HIBRIDS: संरचना के लिए पदानुक्रमित पूर्वाग्रहों के साथ ध्यान-जागरूक लंबे दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण', 'ga': 'HIBRIDS: Aird le Laofacht Ordlathach maidir le hAchoimre ar Dhoiciméid Fhada atá feasach ar Struchtúr', 'ka': 'HIBRIDS: დაახლოები ჰიერარიქული ბუნებისთვის სტრუქტურაციას უცნობიერებელი დოკუმენტის კომპანიზაციაზე', 'el': 'HIBRIDS: Προσοχή με ιεραρχικές προκαταλήψεις για τη διάρθρωση-συνειδητή μακρά περίληψη εγγράφων', 'hu': 'HIBRIDS: Figyelem hierarchikus hiányosságokkal a struktúra-tudatos hosszú dokumentumok összefoglalásához', 'it': 'HIBRIDS: Attenzione con i biasimi gerarchici per una lunga sintesi dei documenti consapevoli della struttura', 'kk': 'HIBRIDS: Құрастыру туралы ұзын құжат тұжырымдамасының иерархикалық бөлшектері', 'lt': 'HIBRIDS: dėmesys su hierarchiniais kliūtimis struktūrai žinomam ilgojo dokumento santraukai', 'mk': 'ХИБРИДС: Внимание со хиерархични навреди за резултатирање на долгите документи со свесност за структурата', 'ml': 'ഹിബ്രിഡ്സ്: സ്ട്രാക്ട്രോക്ടര്\u200d അറിയുന്ന നീണ്ട രേഖയുടെ ചുരുക്കം', 'ms': 'HIBRIDS: Perhatian dengan Bias Hierarkikal untuk Penapisan Dokumen Panjang yang Sedia Struktur', 'mt': 'HIBRIDS: Attenzjoni b’Biases Iераrkiċi għas-Sommarju tad-Dokument Twil li Jinforma dwar l-Istruttura', 'mn': 'ХИБРИД: Структур-ойлголттой урт баримт нийлүүлэлтийн шинжлэх ухаан', 'no': 'HIBRIDS: Attention with Hierarchical Biases for Structure-aware Long Document Summarization', 'ro': 'HIBRIDS: Atenție cu biazele ierarhice pentru rezumarea documentelor lungi conștiente de structură', 'pl': 'HIBRIDS: Uwaga z hierarchicznymi uprzedzeniami dla strukturalnego długiego podsumowania dokumentów', 'sr': 'Pozor sa hijerarhijskim biškovima za sažetak dugog dokumenta u strukturi.', 'so': 'HIBRIDS: Attention with Hierarchical Biases for Structure-aware Long Document Summarization', 'si': 'HIBRIDS: ගොඩක් ලොකු ලොකු විස්තාරය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා හියර්චිකල් බියාස් සමග අවධානය', 'sv': 'HIBRIDER: Uppmärksamhet med hierarkiska missförhållanden för strukturmedveten lång dokumentsammanfattning', 'ta': 'HIBRIDS: Attention with Hierarchical Biases for Structure-aware Long Document Summarization', 'ur': 'HIBRIDS: ساختاری-آگاہ لانگی ڈکومکسٹ جمع کرنا کے لئے حیرارشیل بیز کے ساتھ توجه', 'uz': 'HIBRIDS: Hierarchical Biases for Structure- aware Long Document Summary', 'vi': 'Chào kính cẩn tham quan Ý kiến về tổng kết cấu trúc Tài liệu Long', 'da': 'HIBRIDER: Opmærksomhed med hierarkiske fordele for strukturbevidst lang dokumentopsummering', 'hr': 'HIBRIDS: Pažnja sa hijerarhičkim biškovima za skupljanje dugog dokumenta svjesnog strukture', 'nl': 'HIBRIDS: Aandacht met hiërarchische vooroordelen voor Structuurbewuste Lange Documentsamenvatting', 'de': 'HIBRIDS: Aufmerksamkeit mit hierarchischen Vorurteilen für strukturbewusste Langzeitdokumentzusammenfassung', 'id': 'HIBRIDS: Perhatian dengan Biases Hierarkis untuk Penapisan Dokumen Panjang Bersadar Struktur', 'bg': 'Внимание с йерархични предразсъдъци за обобщаване на дългите документи', 'ko': 'HIBRIDS: 구조를 인식하는 긴 문서 요약의 계층적 편견에 대한 주의', 'sw': 'HIBRIDS: Tazama kwa Makosa ya Miundombinu yenye ufahamu wa Ndege wa Hukumu', 'fa': 'HIBRIDS: توجه با توجه به دوره\u200cهای تحریک برای جمع کردن سند طولانی که به ساختار آگاه می\u200cشود', 'sq': 'HIBRIDS: Vëmendje me kërcënime hierarkike për përmbledhjen e dokumenteve të gjata të ndërgjegjëshme për strukturën', 'af': 'HYBRIDS: Aangaande met hierarske beelde vir Struktuur-bevestig Lang Dokument Opsomming', 'az': 'HIBRIDS: Structure-aware Uzun Document Summarization üçün Hierarchical Biases', 'tr': 'HIBRIDS: Durja Senediň holasasy üçin Hierarchical Biases bilen üns beriş', 'bs': 'HIBRIDS: Pažnja sa hijerarhičkim biškovima za skupljanje dugog dokumenta svjesnog strukture', 'am': 'HIBRIDS: Attention with Hierarchical Biases for Structure-aware Long Document Summarization', 'hy': 'HIBRIDS: Attention with Hierarchical Biases for Structure-aware Long Document Summarization', 'ca': "HIBRIDS: Atència amb els obstáculos hieràrquics per a la resumen dels llargs documents conscients de l'estructura", 'cs': 'HIBRIDS: Pozornost s hierarchickými předsudky pro strukturované dlouhé shrnutí dokumentů', 'et': 'HIBRIDS: Tähelepanu hierarhiliste kallakutega struktuuriteadliku pika dokumendi kokkuvõtte jaoks', 'bn': 'এইচব্রিডস: ক্ষেত্র-পরিচিত নথি সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের জন্য হিয়ারার্কিল বায়েসের সাথে দেখুন', 'fi': 'HIBRIDS: Huomio hierarkisilla ennakkoluuloilla rakennetietoisen pitkän dokumentin yhteenvetoon', 'jv': 'HIBraID: Attention with Jearacial Biase for structural-awake long document Cumarination', 'he': 'היברידס: תשומת לב עם ניזוקים הייררכיים למסכם מסמכים ארוכים מודעים למבנה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'HIBRIDS: Pozornost s hierarhičnimi pristranskostmi za povzetek dolgih dokumentov, ki se zavedajo strukture', 'bo': 'HIBRIDS: Attention with Hierarchical Biases for Structure-aware Long Document Summarization'}
{'en': 'We describe a Question Answering QA dataset that contains complex questions with conditional answers i.e. the answers are only applicable when certain conditions apply We call this dataset ConditionalQA In addition to conditional answers the dataset also features \n long context documents with information that is related in logically complex ways \n multi hop questions that require compositional logical reasoning \n a combination of extractive questions yes no questions questions with multiple answers and not answerable questions \n questions asked without knowing the answers We show that ConditionalQA is challenging for many of the existing QA models especially in selecting answer conditions We believe that this dataset will motivate further research in answering complex questions over long documents', 'ar': 'هيكل الوثيقة أمر بالغ الأهمية لاستهلاك المعلومات بكفاءة. ومع ذلك ، من الصعب ترميزها بكفاءة في بنية Transformer الحديثة. في هذا العمل ، نقدم HIBRIDS ، الذي يضخ التحيزات الهرمية لدمج بنية المستند في حساب درجة الانتباه. نقدم أيضًا مهمة جديدة ، إنشاء ملخص سؤال هرمي ، لتلخيص المحتوى البارز في المستند المصدر في تسلسل هرمي للأسئلة والملخصات ، حيث يستفسر كل سؤال متابعة عن محتوى زوج ملخص الأسئلة الأصل. قمنا أيضًا بتعليق مجموعة بيانات جديدة مع 6153 تسلسلًا هرميًا لملخص الأسئلة المصنفة في التقارير الحكومية. تظهر نتائج التجربة أن نموذجنا ينتج تسلسلات هرمية لملخص الأسئلة أفضل من المقارنات في جودة التدرج الهرمي وتغطية المحتوى ، وهو اكتشاف ردده أيضًا القضاة البشريون. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يعمل نموذجنا على تحسين توليد الملخصات الطويلة من التقارير الحكومية الطويلة ومقالات ويكيبيديا ، كما تم قياسها من خلال درجات ROUGE.', 'es': 'La estructura de los documentos es fundamental para un consumo de información eficiente. Sin embargo, es difícil codificarlo de manera eficiente en la arquitectura moderna de Transformer. En este trabajo, presentamos HIBRIDS, que inyecta sesgos jerárquicos para incorporar la estructura del documento en el cálculo de la puntuación de atención. Presentamos además una nueva tarea, la generación jerárquica de preguntas y resúmenes, para resumir el contenido más destacado del documento fuente en una jerarquía de preguntas y resúmenes, donde cada pregunta de seguimiento pregunta sobre el contenido de su par de preguntas padre y resumen. También anotamos un nuevo conjunto de datos con 6.153 jerarquías de resumen de preguntas etiquetadas en los informes gubernamentales. Los resultados de los experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo produce mejores jerarquías de resumen de preguntas que las comparaciones tanto en la calidad jerárquica como en la cobertura del contenido, un hallazgo que también comparten los jueces humanos. Además, nuestro modelo mejora la generación de resúmenes largos a partir de informes gubernamentales extensos y artículos de Wikipedia, medidos por las puntuaciones ROUGE.', 'fr': "La structure du document est essentielle pour une consommation efficace des informations. Cependant, il est difficile de l'encoder efficacement dans l'architecture moderne de Transformer. Dans ce travail, nous présentons HIBRIDS, qui injecte des biais hiérarchiques pour intégrer la structure du document dans le calcul du score d'attention. Nous présentons également une nouvelle tâche, la génération hiérarchique de questions-résumés, qui permet de résumer le contenu saillant du document source en une hiérarchie de questions et de résumés, chaque question de suivi demandant le contenu de sa paire question-résumé parent. Nous annotons également un nouvel ensemble de données avec 6 153 hiérarchies de résumés de questions étiquetées sur les rapports gouvernementaux. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent que notre modèle produit de meilleures hiérarchies de résumés de questions que les comparaisons à la fois sur la qualité de la hiérarchie et la couverture du contenu, une constatation également reprise par les juges humains. De plus, notre modèle améliore la génération de résumés détaillés à partir de longs rapports gouvernementaux et d'articles Wikipédia, tels que mesurés par les scores ROUGE.", 'pt': 'A estrutura do documento é fundamental para o consumo eficiente de informações. No entanto, é um desafio codificá-lo com eficiência na arquitetura moderna do Transformer. Neste trabalho, apresentamos o HIBRIDS, que injeta Hierarchical Biases for Incorporating Document Structure no cálculo da pontuação de atenção. Apresentamos ainda uma nova tarefa, geração hierárquica de resumo de pergunta, para resumir o conteúdo saliente no documento de origem em uma hierarquia de perguntas e resumos, onde cada pergunta de acompanhamento indaga sobre o conteúdo de seu par pergunta-resumo pai. Também anotamos um novo conjunto de dados com 6.153 hierarquias de resumo de perguntas rotuladas em relatórios governamentais. Os resultados do experimento mostram que nosso modelo produz hierarquias de resumo de perguntas melhores do que comparações tanto na qualidade da hierarquia quanto na cobertura do conteúdo, uma descoberta também ecoada por juízes humanos. Além disso, nosso modelo melhora a geração de resumos longos de longos relatórios governamentais e artigos da Wikipedia, medidos pelas pontuações do ROUGE.', 'ja': '文書構造は、効率的な情報消費のために重要です。 しかし、現代のTransformerアーキテクチャに効率的にエンコードすることは困難です。 本研究では、注意スコア計算に文書構造を組み込んだ階層バイアスfoRを注入するHIBRIDSを紹介します。 さらに、ソースドキュメントの重要なコンテンツを質問と要約の階層に要約するための新しいタスク、階層的質問要約生成を提示します。ここでは、各フォローアップ質問が親質問要約ペアの内容について問い合わせを行います。 また、政府報告書にラベル付けされた6,153の質問概要階層を含む新しいデータセットにも注釈を付けています。 実験結果は、我々のモデルが、階層の質と内容の両方のカバレッジの比較よりも優れた質問要約階層を生成することを示しており、人間の判断者も同様の知見を示しています。 さらに、当社のモデルは、ルージュスコアによって測定される長い政府報告書とウィキペディアの記事からの長い形式の要約の生成を改善します。', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़ संरचना कुशल जानकारी खपत के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है। हालांकि, यह आधुनिक ट्रांसफॉर्मर आर्किटेक्चर में इसे कुशलतासे एन्कोड करने के लिए चुनौतीपूर्ण है। इस काम में, हम HIBRIDS प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो Hierarchical Biases foR को ध्यान स्कोर गणना में दस्तावेज़ संरचना को शामिल करने के लिए इंजेक्ट करता है। हम आगे एक नया कार्य, पदानुक्रमित प्रश्न-सारांश पीढ़ी प्रस्तुत करते हैं, स्रोत दस्तावेज़ में मुख्य सामग्री को प्रश्नों और सारांशों के पदानुक्रम में सारांशित करने के लिए, जहां प्रत्येक अनुवर्ती प्रश्न अपने माता-पिता प्रश्न-सारांश जोड़ी की सामग्री के बारे में पूछताछ करता है। हम सरकारी रिपोर्टों पर लेबल किए गए 6,153 प्रश्न-सारांश पदानुक्रमों के साथ एक नया डेटासेट भी एनोटेट करते हैं। प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल पदानुक्रम गुणवत्ता और सामग्री कवरेज दोनों पर तुलना की तुलना में बेहतर प्रश्न-सारांश पदानुक्रम पैदा करता है, एक खोज भी मानव न्यायाधीशों द्वारा प्रतिध्वनित होती है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हमारा मॉडल लंबी सरकारी रिपोर्टों और विकिपीडिया लेखों से लंबे समय तक सारांश की पीढ़ी में सुधार करता है, जैसा कि रूज स्कोर द्वारा मापा जाता है।', 'zh': '文档构于高效消息消费至重。 然编码于今 Transformer 架构有挑战性也。 于此言之,介于HIBRIDS,则文档构之偏差注于意力分数之中。 臣等更建一新之务,即分层问题摘要成,以总其源文档为问摘要之层次结构,其间每续问其父 - 摘要然。 又为一新数集添注,其含在政府表识之 6,153 一问题摘要层次结构。 实验结果表明与层次结构质比覆盖率,吾形生善问题摘要层次结构,亦得人评委之应。 更入长政府及维基百科文章生长篇摘要,摘要由ROUGE分数。', 'ru': 'Структура документа имеет решающее значение для эффективного потребления информации. Тем не менее, его эффективное кодирование в современной архитектуре Трансформатора является сложной задачей. В этой работе мы представляем HIBRIDS, которая вводит иерархические погрешности для включения структуры документов в расчет баллов внимания. Далее мы представляем новую задачу, иерархическую генерацию вопросов-резюме, для обобщения существенного содержания в исходном документе в иерархию вопросов и резюме, где каждый последующий вопрос спрашивает о содержании его родительской пары вопросов-резюме. Мы также аннотируем новый набор данных с 6153 иерархиями вопросов и резюме, помеченными в правительственных отчетах. Результаты эксперимента показывают, что наша модель дает лучшие иерархии вопросов и резюме, чем сравнения как по качеству иерархии, так и по охвату контента, что также подтверждается человеческими судьями. Кроме того, наша модель улучшает генерацию длинных резюме из длинных правительственных отчетов и статей в Википедии, измеряемых по показателям ROUGE.', 'ga': 'Tá struchtúr doiciméad ríthábhachtach maidir le húsáid éifeachtach faisnéise. Mar sin féin, tá sé dúshlánach é a ionchódú go héifeachtach isteach san ailtireacht nua-aimseartha Trasfhoirmeoir. Sa saothar seo, cuirimid i láthair HIBRIDS, a instealladh Claontacht Ordlathach chun Struchtúr Doiciméid a Ionchorprú i ríomh scóir aird. Cuirimid i láthair freisin tasc nua, giniúint ordlathach achoimre ceisteanna, chun ábhar suntasach sa doiciméad foinseach a achoimriú ina ordlathas ceisteanna agus achoimrí, áit a bhfiosraíonn gach ceist leantach faoi ábhar a péire ceisteanna agus achoimrí tuismitheora. Déanaimid anótáil freisin ar thacar sonraí nua ina bhfuil 6,153 ordlathas ceisteanna-achoimre atá lipéadaithe ar thuarascálacha rialtais. Léiríonn torthaí na dturgnaimh go dtáirgíonn ár múnla ordlathas ceisteanna-achoimre níos fearr ná comparáidí ar cháilíocht ordlathais agus ar chlúdach an ábhair, toradh a bhfuil macalla ag breithiúna daonna freisin. Ina theannta sin, feabhsaíonn ár múnla giniúint achoimrí fada ó thuarascálacha fada rialtais agus ailt Vicipéid, arna dtomhas ag scóir ROUGE.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის სტრუქტურაცია ეფექტიური ინფორმაციის მომხმარებისთვის კრიტიკურია. მაგრამ, ეს ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენება ამოდინარე ტრანფორმეტრის აქტიქტურაციაში. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ HIBRIDS, რომელიც ჰიერარიკალური ბიზების ინექტიკურება foR კომპორტირებული დოკუმენტის სტრუქტურაციას დაახლოებით მონაცემულ ჩვენ შემდეგ ახალი საქმე, იერაქტიკური კითხვების საზოგადომის შესახებ, სადაც ყველა კითხვების საზოგადომის საზოგადომის შესახებ იერაქტიკური და საზოგადომის იერაქტიკური შესახებ. ჩვენ ასევე ახალი მონაცემების შესახებ 6,153 კითხვის საზოგადომის ჰიერაქტიებით, რომლებიც სამუშაო რეპორტის შესახებ ნიშნავს. ექსპერიმენტის შედეგები ჩვენი მოდელი უკეთესი კითხვების საზოგადოება იერაქტია, ვიდრე იერაქტიის კაalitეტის და შემდგომარების შემდეგების შემდგომარება, რომელიც ადამიანი დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო დიდ ფორმების საზოგადოებების შესახებ, როგორც ROUGE წერტილებით მოზომარებულია.', 'el': 'Η δομή εγγράφων είναι κρίσιμη για την αποτελεσματική κατανάλωση πληροφοριών. Ωστόσο, είναι δύσκολο να το κωδικοποιήσουμε αποτελεσματικά στη σύγχρονη αρχιτεκτονική μετασχηματιστή. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε το το οποίο εισάγει ιεραρχικές προκαταλήψεις για την ενσωμάτωση δομής εγγράφου στον υπολογισμό βαθμολογίας προσοχής. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης μια νέα εργασία, την ιεραρχική δημιουργία ερωτήσεων-σύνοψης, για την περίληψη σημαντικού περιεχομένου στο έγγραφο προέλευσης σε μια ιεραρχία ερωτήσεων και περιλήψεων, όπου κάθε ερώτηση παρακολούθησης ρωτά για το περιεχόμενο του μητρικού ζεύγους ερωτήσεων-σύνοψης. Επίσης σχολιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων με 6,153 ιεραρχίες σύνοψης ερωτήσεων που επισημαίνονται στις κυβερνητικές εκθέσεις. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας παράγει καλύτερες ιεραρχίες σύνοψης ερωτήσεων από σύγκριση τόσο για την ποιότητα της ιεραρχίας όσο και για την κάλυψη περιεχομένου, γεγονός που απήχθη και από τους ανθρώπινους κριτές. Επιπλέον, το μοντέλο μας βελτιώνει τη δημιουργία σύνοψης μακράς μορφής από μακροχρόνιες κυβερνητικές εκθέσεις και άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας, όπως μετριέται με τις βαθμολογίες ROUGE.', 'hu': 'A dokumentumszerkezet kulcsfontosságú a hatékony információfelhasználás szempontjából. Azonban kihívást jelent, hogy hatékonyan kódoljuk a modern Transformer architektúrába. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk a HIBRIDS-eket, amelyek Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure beépítését a figyelem pontszámításába fecskendezik be. Továbbá bemutatunk egy új feladatot, hierarchikus kérdés-összefoglaló generációt, amely a forrásdokumentum kiemelkedő tartalmát kérdések és összefoglalók hierarchiájába foglalja össze, ahol minden utólagos kérdés-összefoglaló pár tartalmáról érdeklődik. Egy új adatkészletet is jegyzetelünk 6 153 kérdés-összefoglaló hierarchiával a kormányzati jelentéseken. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jobb kérdések-összefoglaló hierarchiát eredményez, mint a hierarchia minősége és a tartalom lefedettsége tekintetében egyaránt, amit az emberi bírók is visszhangoztak. Modellünk továbbá javítja a hosszú kormányzati jelentések és Wikipédia cikkek hosszú formájú összefoglalóinak előállítását, a ROUGE pontszámok alapján.', 'it': 'La struttura dei documenti è fondamentale per un consumo efficiente di informazioni. Tuttavia, è difficile codificarlo in modo efficiente nella moderna architettura Transformer. In questo lavoro presentiamo HIBRIDS, che inietta Biasi gerarchici foR Incorporating Document Structure nel calcolo del punteggio di attenzione. Presentiamo inoltre un nuovo compito, generazione gerarchica domanda-riepilogo, per riassumere i contenuti salienti nel documento di origine in una gerarchia di domande e riassunti, in cui ogni domanda di follow-up chiede il contenuto della sua coppia domanda-riepilogo genitore. Inoltre annotiamo un nuovo set di dati con 6.153 gerarchie di riepilogo delle domande etichettate sui rapporti governativi. I risultati degli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello produce gerarchie di sintesi delle domande migliori rispetto ai confronti sia sulla qualità gerarchica che sulla copertura dei contenuti, un risultato che riecheggia anche i giudici umani. Inoltre, il nostro modello migliora la generazione di riassunti a lungo termine da lunghi rapporti governativi e articoli di Wikipedia, misurati dai punteggi ROUGE.', 'mk': 'Структурата на документот е критична за ефикасна потрошувачка на информации. However, it is challenging to encode it efficiently into the modern Transformer architecture.  Во оваа работа, го претставуваме ХИБРИДС, кој ги инјектира хиерархичните бези за Incorporating Document Structure во пресметка на резултатите на вниманието. Понатаму претставуваме нова задача, генерација на хиерархични прашања-сумирања, за сумирање на ослободената содржина во изворниот документ во хиерархија на прашања и сумирања, каде секое следно прашање прашува за содржината на својот родителски пар прашања-сумирања. Ние, исто така, анотираме нови податоци со 6.153 хиерархии со преглед на прашања, означени на владините извештаи. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот модел произведува подобри хиерархии со прашања отколку споредби за квалитетот на хиерархијата и покривањето на содржината, откритие кое исто така се повторува и од човечките судии. Покрај тоа, нашиот модел ја подобрува генерацијата на долгорочни резултати од долги владини извештаи и статии од Википедија, според оценките на РУГЕ.', 'lt': 'Dokumentų struktūra yra labai svarbi veiksmingam informacijos suvartojimui. Vis dėlto sunku jį veiksmingai koduoti į šiuolaikinę Transformer architektūrą. Šiame darbe pristatome HIBRIDS, kuri į dėmesio taškų skaičiavimą įtraukia Hierarchinius Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure. Be to, mes pristatome naują užduotį, hierarchinę klausimų santraukos kartą, apibendrinant pagrindinio turinio šaltinio dokumente į klausimų ir santraukų hierarchiją, kurioje kiekvienas tolesnis klausimas klausia apie savo pagrindinio klausimų santraukos poros turinį. Taip pat komentuojame naują duomenų rinkinį su 6 153 klausimų santraukų hierarchijomis, pažymėtomis vyriausybės ataskaitose. Eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis sukuria geresnes klausimų santraukų hierarchijas nei hierarchijos kokybės ir turinio aprėpties palyginimus, kuriuos taip pat pakartoja žmonių teisėjai. Be to, mūsų modelis pagerina ilgalaikių santraukų, gautų iš ilgų vyriausybės ataskaitų ir Wikipedia straipsnių, sukūrimą, remiantis ROUGE rezultatais.', 'kk': 'Құжаттың құрылымы эффективті мәліметті пайдалану үшін маңызды. Бірақ, бұл күнделікті түрлендіруші архитектурасына көмектесу қиын. Бұл жұмыс ішінде HIBRIDS дегенді таңдаймыз. Бұл Hirarchical Biases foR Құжаттың құрылғысын назарды есептеу үшін инжектеп береді. Біз басқа жаңа тапсырма, иерархикалық сұрақ тұжырымдамасын құру үшін көздегі құжаттың сұрақтар мен тұжырымдамасының иерархиясына сұрақтар мен тұжырымдамасының мазмұнын сұрау үшін, кейін әрбір сұрақтар Сонымен қатар, үкіметтің хабарламаларына жазылған 6 153 сұрақ тұжырымдамасының иерархиясын жаңа деректер жиынын жазып береміз. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің иерархияның сапасы және мазмұның мәтінінің салыстыруынан да жақсы сұрақ тұжырымдамасының иерархиясын жасайтынын көрсетеді. Мәселелер Қосымша, біздің моделіміз ROUGE нөмірлерімен өлшерілген ұзын түрлі тұжырымдамасын ұзын үкімет хабарламаларынан және Википедия мақалаларынан жасайды.', 'ms': 'Struktur dokumen adalah kritikal untuk penggunaan maklumat efisien. Namun, ia adalah cabaran untuk mengekodkannya secara efektif ke dalam arkitektur Transformer modern. Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan HIBRIDS, yang menyuntik Biases Hierarkikal foR Incorporating Document Structure ke dalam pengiraan skor perhatian. Kami juga memperkenalkan tugas baru, generasi soalan-ringkasan hierarkik, untuk menghitung kandungan salient dalam dokumen sumber ke dalam hierarki soalan dan ringkasan, di mana setiap soalan berikut bertanya tentang kandungan pasangan soalan-ringkasan induknya. Kami juga menyatakan set data baru dengan 6,153 hierarki soalan-ringkasan yang ditabel pada laporan kerajaan. Experiment results show that our model produces better question-summary hierarchies than comparisons on both hierarchy quality and content coverage, a finding also echoed by human judges.  Selain itu, model kami memperbaiki generasi ringkasan bentuk panjang dari laporan kerajaan panjang dan artikel Wikipedia, seperti diukur oleh skor ROUGE.', 'ml': 'സാധുവായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രേഖയുടെ ഘട്ടം എന്നാലും ആധുനിക ക്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോറന്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് അതിനെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഇത് വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തു ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഹിബ്രിഡ്സിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ബൈസുകള്\u200d ഫോറിനെ പ്രവേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. രേഖകള്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ജോലിയെ കൂടി കൂടുതല്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചോദിക്കുന്ന തലമുറതലമുറയാക്കുന്നു, സോര്\u200dസ്സിലുള്ള സലിവേഷന്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളെ ചുരുക്കിക്കൊണ്ട് ചോദ്യങ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റാസെറ്റിനെയും പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു. സര്\u200dക്കാര്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടുകളില്\u200d അറിയിച്ച്  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഉത്തമമായ ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത കൂടാതെ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നീണ്ട രൂപത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ തലമുറയില്\u200d നീണ്ട രൂപത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വിക്കിപീഡിയയുടെ രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും', 'mt': 'L-istruttura tad-dokument hija kritika għall-konsum effiċjenti tal-informazzjoni. Madankollu, huwa diffiċli li tiġi kkodifikata b’mod effiċjenti fl-arkitettura moderna tat-Transformer. In this work, we present HIBRIDS, which injects Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure into attention score calculation.  Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll kompitu ġdid, ġenerazzjoni ġerarkika ta’ mistoqsijiet fil-qosor, biex il-kontenut salienti fid-dokument tas-sors jiġi sommarjat f’ġerarkija ta’ mistoqsijiet u sommarji, fejn kull mistoqsija ta’ segwitu tinvestiga dwar il-kontenut tal-pari prinċipali tagħha ta’ mistoqsijiet fil-qosor. Aħna nnotaw ukoll sett ta’ dejta ġdid b’6,153 ġerarkija fil-qosor tal-mistoqsijiet ittikkettati fuq rapporti tal-gvern. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru li l-mudell tagħna jipproduċi ġerarkiji a ħjar bejn mistoqsijiet u sommarji milli paraguni kemm dwar il-kwalità tal-ġerarkija kif ukoll dwar il-kopertura tal-kontenut, sejba li tirrifletti wkoll l-imħallfin umani. Barra minn hekk, il-mudell tagħna jtejjeb il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ sommarji fit-tul minn rapporti twal tal-gvern u artikoli tal-Wikipedia, kif imkejla mill-punteġġi ROUGE.', 'pl': 'Struktura dokumentu ma kluczowe znaczenie dla efektywnego zużycia informacji. Wyzwaniem jest jednak sprawne zakodowanie go w nowoczesnej architekturze Transformera. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy HIBRIDS, który wstrzykuje hierarchiczne uprzedzenia dla włączenia struktury dokumentu do obliczania punktu uwagi. Ponadto przedstawiamy nowe zadanie, hierarchiczne generowanie pytań-podsumowania, służące do podsumowania istotnych treści w dokumencie źródłowym w hierarchię pytań i podsumowań, w której każde pytanie następcze pyta o treść swojej pary macierzystej pytanie-podsumowanie. Opisujemy również nowy zestaw danych z hierarchią podsumowania pytań 6,153 oznaczoną w raportach rządowych. Wyniki eksperymentów pokazują, że nasz model tworzy lepsze hierarchii podsumowania pytań niż porównania zarówno w zakresie jakości hierarchii, jak i zasięgu treści, co również odnotowano przez ludzkich sędziów. Ponadto nasz model usprawnia generowanie długofalowych podsumowań z długich raportów rządowych i artykułów Wikipedii, mierzonych przez wyniki ROUGE.', 'mn': 'Документын бүтэц нь үр ашигтай мэдээллийн хэрэглээнд чухал. Гэвч орчин үеийн Трансформер архитектурд үүнийг үр дүнтэй холбох нь хэцүү. Энэ ажлын дараа бид HIBRIDS-г харуулж байна. Энэ нь Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure нь анхаарлын тооны тооны тооцоололт болно. Бид үүнийг эх баримтын шинэ асуулт болон жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийг нэмэгдүүлэхэд шинэ ажил, асуулт, асуулт, жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийн тухай асуулт бүр эцэг эхийн асуулт, жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийн тухай асуудаг. Мөн бид засгийн газрын мэдээлэл дээр нэрлэгдсэн 6.153 асуулт дээрх шинэ өгөгдлийн сангуудыг анзаарсан. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь асуулт дээр хэвлэгдэх дүгнэлүүдийг харьцуулахаас илүү сайн бий болгодог. Хүмүүсийн шүүмжлэгчдийн харьцуулалтыг харьцуулахаас илүү сайн олгодог. Мөн бидний загвар нь урт засгийн газрын мэдээллээс болон Википедийн баримтуудын урт хэмжээний нийтлэлийг сайжруулдаг.', 'no': 'Dokumentstruktur er kritisk for effektivt informasjonsbruk. Det er likevel vanskeleg å koda det effektivt i den moderne transformeringsarkitekturen. I denne arbeiden presenterer vi HIBRIDS, som injiserer Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure into attention score calculation. Vi viser meir ei ny oppgåve, hierarkisk oppgåve og sammendrag, for å summarisera salient-innhaldet i kjeldedokumentet til eit hierarki av spørsmål og sammendrag, der kvar oppgåve spørsmål spør om innhaldet i den foreldre spørsmålssamandrag. Vi annoterar også ein ny dataset med 6.153 spørsmål-samandringshierarki merket på regjeringsrapporter. Eksperimentresultatet viser at modellen vår produserer bedre hierarki for spørsmålsamningar enn sammenligningar med både hierarkvaliteten og innhaldsomslag, og eit finning også er ikona av menneske reglar. I tillegg er modellen vårt forbetra generering av langform sammendragar frå lange regjeringsrapporter og Wikipediaartikler, som målt av ROUGE-poeng.', 'ro': 'Structura documentelor este esențială pentru un consum eficient de informații. Cu toate acestea, este dificil să-l codăm eficient în arhitectura modernă Transformer. În această lucrare, prezentăm HIBRIDS, care injectează Biase ierarhice foR Incorporating Document Structure în calculul scorului de atenție. De asemenea, prezentăm o nouă sarcină, generarea ierarhică de întrebări-rezumat, pentru rezumarea conținutului salient din documentul sursă într-o ierarhie de întrebări și rezumate, în cazul în care fiecare întrebare ulterioară întreabă despre conținutul perechii sale părinte de întrebare-rezumat. De asemenea, adnotăm un nou set de date cu 6.153 ierarhii de rezumat al întrebărilor etichetate în rapoartele guvernamentale. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că modelul nostru produce ierarhii mai bune de rezumat-întrebări decât comparații atât privind calitatea ierarhiei, cât și acoperirea conținutului, o constatare, de asemenea, ecou de judecătorii umani. În plus, modelul nostru îmbunătățește generarea de rezumate de formă lungă din rapoarte guvernamentale lungi și articole Wikipedia, măsurate prin scorurile ROUGE.', 'sr': 'Struktura dokumenta je kritična za efikasnu potrošnju informacija. Međutim, teško je da je efikasno kodiramo u modernu arhitekturu transformera. U ovom poslu predstavljamo HIBRIDS, koji injekuje Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure u kalkulaciju rezultata pažnje. Dalje predstavljamo novi zadatak, hijerarhijsku generaciju i sažetak pitanja, za sažetak sadržaja salijanta u izvornom dokumentu u hijerarhiju pitanja i sažetaka, gde svako pitanje za praćenje pita o sadržaju svog roditelja i sažetka pitanja. Takođe annotiramo novu podatku sa 6.153 hijerarhijom o sažetku pitanja označenim na izveštajima vlade. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da naš model proizvodi bolje hijerarhije o sažetku pitanja nego usporedbe kvalitete hijerarhije i sadržaja, pronalazak koji je takođe proglašen ljudskim sudijima. Osim toga, naš model poboljšava generaciju dugoroformnih sažetaka iz dugih izveštaja vlade i članaka Wikipedije, kako je mjereno po rezultatima ROUGE-a.', 'si': 'දස්තාවෙන් ස්ථාපනය ප්\u200dරශ්ණත තොරතුරු භාවිතා වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂයි. ඒත්, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අධ්\u200dයාන්\u200dය වෙනස් කරණාකරණය ස්ථාපනයට ඒක කොඩ් කරන්න. මේ වැඩේ අපි HIBRIDS පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒ වගේම හියර්චිකල් බියාස් කරන්නේ foR සම්පූර්ණ විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය සංවිධානය අවධාන අපි තව අලුත් වැඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, අයිරිකාෂික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්-සාමාර්ථක විස්තරයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සාමාර්ථක විස්තරයක් සාමාර්ථක විස්තර කරනවා, හ අපි අළුත් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්න සංවිධානයක් තියෙනවා. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් හොඳ ප්\u200dරශ්න-සංශ්ණ සංශ්ණාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා, මිනිස්සු නිර් තවත්, අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණය සහ විකිපිඩියා ප්\u200dරමාණය, ROUGE ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් මාපනය කරනවා.', 'so': "Tilmaamaha dukumentigu waa muhiim u ah isticmaalka macluumaadka faa’iidada ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay dhibaato ku leedahay in aad si fiican ugu kooban karto dhismaha qaabilaadda ee modern-horaadka. Shuqulkaas, waxaynu keenaynaa HIBRIDS, kaas oo hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure into xisaab xisaab. Sidoo kale waxaynu u soo bandhignaa shaqo cusub, qarni xagaag, si aan ugu soo summarinayno waxyaabaha saliidda ee warqada asalka ah, waxaana ka dhigaynaa hierarchy su'aalo iyo summirka, meesha ay ku weydiinayaan su'aalo soo socda oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha ay ku jiraan su'aalaha xagaaga waalidka. Sidoo kale waxaynu ogeysiinaynaa sawir cusub oo ay ku qoran yihiin 6,153 hierarchies ee su'aalaha xagaaga ah oo lagu qoray warqadaha dowladda. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in modellkayagu uu soo saaraa hierarkii wax ka wanaagsan su’aalaha xagaaga ee ugu dhow, tusaale ahaan u sameynta qiimaha hierarkii iyo daboolka waxyaabaha ku jira, taas oo lagu helo xaakinnada dadku. Additionally, our model improves the generation of long-form summaries from long government reports and Wikipedia articles, as measured by ROUGE scores.", 'sv': 'Dokumentstrukturen är avgörande för effektiv informationskonsumtion. Det är dock svårt att koda den effektivt i den moderna Transformer-arkitekturen. I detta arbete presenterar vi HIBRIDS, som injicerar Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure i uppmärksamhetspoäng beräkning. Vidare presenterar vi en ny uppgift, hierarkisk fråga-sammanfattning generation, för att sammanfatta framträdande innehåll i källdokumentet i en hierarki av frågor och sammanfattningar, där varje uppföljningsfråga frågar sig om innehållet i sitt överordnade fråga-sammanfattning par. Vi kommenterar också ett nytt dataset med 6 153 frågesammanfattningshierarkier märkta på regeringsrapporter. Experimentsresultaten visar att vår modell ger bättre frågesammanfattningshierarkier än jämförelser på både hierarkikvalitet och innehållstäckning, vilket även återspeglas av mänskliga domare. Dessutom förbättrar vår modell skapandet av långsiktiga sammanfattningar från långa regeringsrapporter och Wikipedia-artiklar, mätt med ROUGE-poäng.', 'ta': 'தேவையான தகவல் பயன்பாடுக்கு ஆவண அமைப்பு முக்கியமானது. However, it is challenging to encode it efficiently into the modern Transformer architecture.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஹிபிரிட்ஸை காண்பிக்கிறோம், அது உயர்நிலையான பைஸ் கோப்பினை சுருக்குகிறது, அது கவனத்தின் கணிப்பு கணக்கீட் நாம் மூலத்தில் உள்ள விற்பனை உள்ளடக்கங்களை சுருக்கும் பொருட்டு கேள்விகள் மற்றும் சுருக்கத்தின் தலைப்புக்காக ஒரு புதிய பணியை கொண்டுவருகிறோம், பின்பற் நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் 6,153 கேள்வி சுருக்கம் தலைப்புகளை குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளோம். முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது என்றால் எங்கள் மாதிரி கேள்வி சுருக்கம் முன்னேற்றங்களை விட சிறந்த கேள்வியை உருவாக்குகிறது மேலும்  கூடுதலாக, நீண்ட அரசு அறிக்கைகள் மற்றும் விகிபிடியா கட்டுரைகளில் இருந்து நீண்ட வடிவமைப்பு சுருக்கங்களின் உருவாக்கத்தை மேம', 'ur': 'دفتر کی ساختار مفصل معلومات مصرف کے لئے ضرورت ہے۔ اگرچہ، اس کو مدرن ترنسفور معماری میں اکنود کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے. اس کام میں ہم HIBRIDS کو پیش کریں گے، جو ہیر ریچکل بیزار کے ذریعے روزنامہ ساختاری کو توجه کے اسکور کی حساب میں تزریق کرتا ہے. اور ہم نے ایک نوی تابع، سؤال و سؤال و سؤال کی نسل کو پیش کیا ہے، سورس دکھانے میں ایک سؤال اور سؤال کی سؤال اور سؤال کی سؤال کے بارے میں، جہاں ہر اچھی سؤال کے بارے میں سوال کرتا ہے اپنے ماں باپ سؤال و سؤال کے ذریعہ کے بارے میں. ہم نے بھی 6,153 سوال کے سامنے ایک نئی ڈاٹ سٹ کو اظہار کیا ہے جو حکومت راپوروں پر لکھی جاتی ہے۔ آزمائش نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل بہتر سوال-سراسر آزمائش پیدا کرتا ہے اس سے بھی بہتر سوال-سراسر آزمائش پیدا کرتا ہے کہ دونوں آزمائش کی کیفیت اور منصفات کی کاوٹ پر مقایسہ کرتا ہے، اور انسان کے قاضوں نے بھی اپنا اور اضافہ، ہماری مدل لوازی فرمول کی نسل کو طویل حکومت راپورٹ اور ویکیپیڈیا لکھوں کی نسل سے بہتر کر دیتا ہے، جس طرح ROUGE اسکورٹ سے اندازہ کیا گیا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, bu uni yangi Transformer arkitektikasiga ishlab chiqarish qiyin qiladi. Bu ishda, biz HIBRIDS hozir qilamiz, bu Hierarchical Biases foydalanadi. Hujjatning tuzuvlarini qiymatni hisoblash qiymatiga kiritish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Шунингдек, биз ҳукумат маълумотларига ишора қилинган 6,153 саволлар асосий маълумотларни тарқатурмиз. Tekshirish natijalari esa modelimiz haqida o'xshash savol-kichkinagi hierarchiyatlarni o'xshash o'xshashlanadi. Hierarchiyat sifatida va tarkib qarashdan ham o'xshash narsalarni ko'rsatadi. Ko'pchilik, bizning modelmiz, uzun pul hisobotidan va Wikipedia maqolalaridan foydalanuvchi qismlarni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Tài liệu có cấu trúc rất quan trọng với mục tiêu thông tin. Tuy nhiên, thật khó để mã hóa nó một cách hiệu quả vào công trình biến hình hiện đại. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi giới thiệu HIsơ, thứ sẽ thêm cấu trúc Tài liệu Hieratic Bians tương tác vào bảng tập trung ghi chú ý. Chúng tôi còn đưa ra một nhiệm vụ mới, hệ thống phân tích các câu hỏi tổng hợp, để tóm tắt các nội dung nổi bật trong tài liệu nguồn vào một hệ thống phân cấp các câu hỏi và tóm tắt, nơi mỗi câu hỏi tiếp theo hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi hỏi của nó. Chúng tôi cũng ghi chú một bộ dữ liệu mới với 6,153 các hệ thống kiểm tra đầy đủ được ghi vào báo cáo chính phủ. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng tôi tạo ra các hệ thống kiểm tra tổng quát tốt hơn so với so sánh về chất lượng phân cấp và nội dung. Thêm nữa, mô hình của chúng tôi cải thiện việc tạo các bản tóm tắt hình dạng dài từ các báo cáo chính phủ dài và các bài báo Wikipedia, như được đánh giá bằng những điểm số của ROSEME.', 'da': 'Dokumentstruktur er afgørende for et effektivt informationsforbrug. Men det er udfordrende at indkode det effektivt i den moderne Transformer arkitektur. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi HIBRIDS, som injicerer Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure i opmærksomhed score beregning. Vi præsenterer endvidere en ny opgave, hierarkisk spørgsmål-resumégeneration, til at opsummere vigtigt indhold i kildedokumentet i et hierarki af spørgsmål og resuméer, hvor hvert opfølgende spørgsmål spørger sig om indholdet af dets overordnede spørgsmål-resumépar. Vi annoterer også et nyt datasæt med 6.153 spørgsmål-resuméhierarkier mærket på regeringsrapporter. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model producerer bedre spørgsmål-summariske hierarkier end sammenligninger på både hierarkisk kvalitet og indholdsdækning, et fund, der også ekko af menneskelige dommere. Desuden forbedrer vores model genereringen af lange resuméer fra lange regeringsrapporter og Wikipedia-artikler, målt ved ROUGE scores.', 'hr': 'Struktura dokumenta je kritična za učinkovitu potrošnju informacija. Međutim, teško je to učinkovito kodirati u modernu arhitekturu transformera. U ovom poslu predstavljamo HIBRIDS, koji ubrizgava Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure u procjenu rezultata pažnje. Dalje predstavljamo novi zadatak, hijerarhička generacija sažetka pitanja, za sažetak sadržaja salijanta u izvornom dokumentu u hijerarhiju pitanja i sažetka, gdje se svako pitanje za praćenje pita o sadržaju svog roditelja i sažetka pitanja. Također smo navodili novu podatku sa 6.153 hijerarhijom o sažetku pitanja označenim na izvještajima vlade. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da naš model proizvodi bolje hijerarhije o sažetku pitanja nego usporedbe kvalitete hijerarhije i sadržaja, pronalazak koji je također proglašen ljudskim sudijima. Osim toga, naš model poboljšava generaciju dugoročnih sažetaka iz dugih izvještaja vlade i članaka Wikipedije, kako je mjereno rezultatima ROUGE-a.', 'nl': 'Documentstructuur is cruciaal voor een efficiënt informatieverbruik. Het is echter een uitdaging om het efficiënt te coderen in de moderne Transformer architectuur. In dit werk presenteren we HIBRIDS, dat hiërarchische vooroordelen voor Incorporating Document Structure injecteert in de attentiescore berekening. Verder presenteren we een nieuwe taak, hiërarchische vraag-samenvattingsgeneratie, voor het samenvatten van belangrijke inhoud in het brondocument in een hiërarchie van vragen en samenvattingen, waarbij elke vervolgvraag vraagt naar de inhoud van het ouderpaar vraag-samenvatting. We annoteren ook een nieuwe dataset met 6,153 vragensamenvattingshiërarchieën gelabeld op overheidsrapporten. De resultaten van experimenten tonen aan dat ons model betere hiërarchieën met vragensamenvattingen produceert dan vergelijkingen op zowel hiërarchiekwaliteit als inhoudsdekking, een bevinding die ook door menselijke juryleden werd herhaald. Daarnaast verbetert ons model het genereren van lange samenvattingen uit lange overheidsrapporten en Wikipedia-artikelen, gemeten aan de hand van ROUGE scores.', 'bg': 'Структурата на документа е от решаващо значение за ефективното потребление на информация. Въпреки това е предизвикателство да го кодираме ефективно в съвременната архитектура на трансформаторите. В тази работа представяме ХИБРИДИ, който инжектира йерархични предразсъдъци за включване на структурата на документа в изчисляването на оценката на вниманието. Представяме и нова задача, йерархично генериране на въпрос-резюме, за обобщаване на видното съдържание в изходния документ в йерархия от въпроси и резюмета, където всеки следващ въпрос пита за съдържанието на родителската двойка въпрос-резюме. Също така анотираме нов набор от данни с 6 153 йерархии с резюме на въпросите, етикетирани в правителствените доклади. Резултатите от експериментите показват, че нашият модел произвежда по-добри йерархии с резюме на въпроси, отколкото сравнения както по отношение на качеството на йерархията, така и по отношение на съдържанието, откритие, което също се отразява на човешките съдии. Освен това нашият модел подобрява генерирането на дългосрочни резюмета от дълги правителствени доклади и статии в Уикипедия, измерени чрез оценките на ROUGE.', 'ko': '문서 구조는 효율적인 정보 소비에 매우 중요하다.그러나 이를 현대 변압기 구조에 효과적으로 인코딩하는 것은 도전이다.이 작업에서 우리는 문서 구조를 주의력 점수 계산에 포함시키기 위해 차원의 편견을 주입한 HIBRIDS를 제기했다.우리는 더욱 새로운 임무를 제기했다. 즉, 층별 문제 요약 생성은 원본 문서의 중요한 내용을 문제와 요약의 차원 구조로 정리하는 데 사용되며, 그 중에서 각 후속 문제는 부문제 요약이 맞는 내용을 묻는다.우리는 또 새로운 데이터 집합을 주석했는데, 그 중에서 정부 보고서에 6153개의 문제 요약 차원 구조를 표시했다.실험 결과에 의하면 차원의 질과 내용의 범위에 있어 우리 모델이 발생한 문제 요약의 차원이 비교적 좋다는 것을 알 수 있다. 이 발견은 인류 법관의 호응을 얻었다.그 밖에 우리 모델은 장정부 보고서와 위키백과 기사에서 성장 양식의 요약을 낳는 과정을 개선했는데 이것은 연지 평점을 통해 평가한 것이다.', 'fa': 'ساختار سند برای مصرف اطلاعات موثر مهم است. با این حال، این سخت است که آن را به طور موثرت در معماری تغییر دهنده مدرن کودک کنیم. در این کار، ما HIBRIDS را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که تزریق می\u200cکند ساختار سند شامل توجه به محاسبات امتیاز توجه. ما بعدش یک کار جدید، نسل سوال و جمع\u200cآوری سؤال\u200cهای مختلف را برای جمع کردن محتویات طبیعی در سند منبع به یک مجموعه سوال و جمع\u200cآوری می\u200cنماییم، جایی که هر سوال دنبال\u200cآوری در مورد محتویات جفت\u200cجمع\u200cآوری والدینش می\u200cپرسد. ما همچنین یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید را با مدارک 6.153 جریان سوال که بر گزارش های دولت نشان داده می\u200cکنیم نشان می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما از مقایسه\u200cهای بهتر از کیفیت و محتویات محتویات، یک یادآوری که توسط قاضی\u200cهای انسان تغییر داده می\u200cشود، بهتر از مقایسه\u200cهای کیفیت و محتویات را تولید می\u200cکند. اضافه این، مدل ما نسل جمعیت طولانی از گزارش های دولتی طولانی و مقاله های ویکیپدیا را بهتر می کند، همانطور که توسط امتیاز ROUGE اندازه شده است.', 'de': 'Die Dokumentenstruktur ist entscheidend für einen effizienten Informationsverbrauch. Es ist jedoch eine Herausforderung, es effizient in die moderne Transformer-Architektur zu kodieren. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir HIBRIDS vor, das hierarchische Vorurteile für Incorporating Document Structure in die Aufmerksamkeits-Score-Berechnung injiziert. Weiterhin stellen wir eine neue Aufgabe vor, die hierarchische Frage-Zusammenfassung-Generierung, für die Zusammenfassung wichtiger Inhalte im Quelldokument in eine Hierarchie von Fragen und Zusammenfassungen, in der jede Folgefrage nach dem Inhalt ihres übergeordneten Frage-Zusammenfassung-Paars fragt. Wir kommentieren auch einen neuen Datensatz mit 6,153 Fragenübersichtshierarchien, die in Regierungsberichten beschriftet sind. Die Ergebnisse der Experimente zeigen, dass unser Modell bessere Hierarchien für Fragezusammenfassungen liefert als Vergleiche sowohl hinsichtlich der Hierarchiequalität als auch der Inhaltsabdeckung, was auch von menschlichen Richtern bestätigt wurde. Darüber hinaus verbessert unser Modell die Generierung von Langform-Zusammenfassungen aus langen Regierungsberichten und Wikipedia-Artikeln, gemessen an ROUGE-Scores.', 'sw': 'Miundombinu ya waraka ni muhimu kwa matumizi ya habari yenye ufanisi. Hata hivyo, ni changamoto ya kuingia katika jengo la mpya la Tafsiri. Katika kazi hii, tunaweka huduma za HIBRIDS, ambazo zinaingiza mabadiliko ya Hierarchical fo ya Mradi wa Udhibiti wa Hukumu wa Kuingiza kwenye hisabu. Tunaonyesha kazi mpya, kizazi cha muhtasari wa maswali, kwa kuhakikisha maudhui ya maudhui ya mauzo ya mauzo katika nyaraka ya vyanzo katika mfululizo wa maswali na muhtasari, ambapo kila swali la ufuatiliaji linauliza kuhusu maudhui ya wanandoa wa muhtasari. Pia tunaelezea taarifa mpya yenye makazi ya muhtasari 6,153 yaliyoonyesha kwenye taarifa za serikali. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unatengeneza makazi bora ya maswali ya muhtasari kuliko ukilinganishwa na kiwango cha ubora na taarifa za maudhui, utafiti unaofanywa na majaji wa binadamu. Zaidi ya hayo, mifano yetu inaboresha uzalishaji wa muhtasari wa muda mrefu kutoka kwenye ripoti ndefu za serikali na makala za Wikipedia, kama ilivyokadiriwa na vipindi vya ROUGE.', 'tr': "Sened yapısı täsirli maglumat tüketmesi üçin wajyplydir. Ýöne, muny modern Transformer arhitekturusyna efekt ködlemek kynçylykly. Bu işde, biz HIBRIDS'i, hijerarşik Biýetler boýunça hasaplanýar. Sened Structure'i üns अ अंतर hasaplamaga görkeýäris. Biz daňa täze bir zady, iýerarhiýa soragy-hulamy döretmek üçin çeşme senediň salient mazmunlaryny soraglaryň we hulamlaryň iýerarhiýasyna üýtgedýäris. Bu ýerde her yzarlanjak soragy ene soragy-hulamyň içinde soraýar. Biz hem hökümet raporlarynda etiket edilen 6,153 sorag hijerarhiýasynda täze bir dataseti duýýarys. Testler netijesi biziň modelimiz hem hijerarhiýanyň kalitesinde hem maksadyň deňleşmesinden has gowy soraglaryň iýerarhiýasyny çykarýandygyny görkezip edendigini görkez. Munuň üçin, biziň modelimiz ROUGE sanlary tarapyndan ölçülendirilen uzyn şekli hasaplamalaryň döwletlerini geliştirir.", 'af': "Dokumentstruktuur is kritiese vir effektief inligting verbruik. Maar dit is moeilik om dit effektief te kodeer in die moderne Transformer-arkitektuur. In hierdie werk stel ons HIBRIDS voor, wat Hierarchical Biases foR Inkorporering Dokumentstruktuur in aanmerkstelling berekening. Ons stel verder 'n nuwe taak, hierarkies vraag-opsomming generasie, vir die opsomming van salient inhoud in die bron dokument in 'n hierarkie van vrae en opsomming, waar elke volg-opsomming vraag vra oor die inhoud van sy ouer vraag-opsomming paar. Ons het ook 'n nuwe datastel aangetel met 6,153 vraag-opsomming hierarkies wat op regeringraporte gemerk is. Eksperiment resultate wys dat ons model beter vraag-opsomming hierarkies produseer as vergelykings op beide hierarkie kwaliteit en inhoud dekking, 'n vinding ook uitgevoer deur menslike regters. Ons model verbeter ook die generasie van lang vorm opsommings van lang regeringraporte en Wikipedia-artikels, soos gemeet deur ROUGE-telling.", 'id': 'Struktur dokumen kritis untuk konsumsi informasi efisien. Namun, menantang untuk mengekodikannya secara efisien ke arsitektur Transformer modern. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempersembahkan HIBRIDS, yang menyuntik Biases Hierarchical foR Incorporating Document Structure ke kalkulasi skor perhatian. Kami lebih lanjut mempersembahkan tugas baru, generasi hierarkis pertanyaan-ringkasan, untuk mempersingkatkan isi yang penting dalam dokumen sumber ke dalam hierarki pertanyaan dan ringkasan, dimana setiap pertanyaan berikutnya bertanya tentang isi pasangan pertanyaan-ringkasan induknya. Kami juga menyatakan dataset baru dengan 6.153 pertanyaan-ringkasan hierarki yang ditabel di laporan pemerintah. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita menghasilkan hierarki pertanyaan-ringkasan yang lebih baik daripada perbandingan pada kualitas hierarki dan penutupan isi, penemuan juga dipenuhi oleh hakim manusia. Selain itu, model kami memperbaiki generasi ringkasan bentuk panjang dari laporan panjang pemerintah dan artikel Wikipedia, menurut nilai ROUGE.', 'sq': 'Struktura e dokumentit është kritike për konsumin e efektshëm të informacionit. Megjithatë, është sfidë për ta koduar atë me efektshmëri në arkitekturën moderne Transformer. In this work, we present HIBRIDS, which injects Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure into attention score calculation.  Ne paraqesim më tej një detyrë të re, gjeneratë hierarkike pyetjeje-përmbledhje, për përmbledhjen e përmbajtjes së rëndësishme në dokumentin burimor në një hierarki pyetjesh dhe përmbledhjesh, ku çdo pyetje e ndjekjes pyet rreth përmbajtjes së çiftit prindër pyetjeje-përmbledhje të saj. Ne gjithashtu anotojmë një grup të ri të dhënash me 6,153 hierarki pyetjeje-përmbledhje të etiketuar në raportet e qeverisë. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tregojnë se modeli ynë prodhon hierarki më të mira pyetje-përmbledhje sesa krahasime në cilësinë e hierarkisë dhe mbulimin e përmbajtjes, një zbulim që është echosur gjithashtu nga gjyqtarët njerëzorë. Përveç kësaj, modeli ynë përmirëson gjeneratën e përmbledhjeve të form ës së gjatë nga raportet e gjata qeveritare dhe artikujt e Wikipedias, siç matën nga rezultatet ROUGE.', 'am': 'ሰነድ መሠረት ለጥቅም መረጃ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በአዲስ የአሁኑ ትርጉም ትርጉም መሠረት ውስጥ በጥቅም ማቀናቀል ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ HIBRIDS እናቀርባታለን፤ ይህም ሰነድ አካባቢ ሰነድ ቁጥጥር ሲቆጠር የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡ We further present a new task, hierarchical question-summary generation, for summarizing salient content in the source document into a hierarchy of questions and summaries, where each follow-up question inquires about the content of its parent question-summary pair.  ደግሞ በመንግሥት ሪፖርት ላይ የተጻፈውን 6,153 የጥያቄ አዲስ ዳታተር ዜና እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ሞዴሌዎቻችን የጥያቄ ጥያቄ አዳራጊዎችን ከመተያየት የሚሻል ጥያቄ እና የውይይት ጥያቄ እና የውይይት ጥያቄ እና ከሰው ፈራጆች የተመለከተ ማግኘት እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የረጅም የረጅም መልዕክት ትውልድ የረጅም መንግሥት ሪፖርት እና የWikipedia ጽሑፎች በሮዑGE scores እንደተለካ ሞዴል ያሳድጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Թղթերի կառուցվածքը կարևոր է տեղեկատվության արդյունավետ սպառման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, դժվար է այն արդյունավետ կոդավորել ժամանակակից Թանֆերմերների ճարտարապետության մեջ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք Հիբրիդը, որը ներարկում է Հիերարքիկական Բեսանյութեր Թղթերի կառուցվածքը ուշադրության գնահատականների հաշվարկում: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք նոր խնդիր, հիերարխիկ հարցերի համառոտագրման սերունդ, որպեսզի համառոտագրենք աղբյուր փաստաթղթի նշանակալի պարունակությունը հարցերի և համառոտագրությունների հիերարխիայի մեջ, որտեղ յուրաքանչյուր հետագա հարց հարցնում է իր ծնողների հարցերի համառո Մենք նաև նկարագրում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը ունի 6,153 հարցերի համառոտագրման հիերարխիաներ, որոնք նշանված են կառավարության զեկույցների վրա: Experiment results show that our model produces better question-summary hierarchies than comparisons on both hierarchy quality and content coverage, a finding also echoed by human judges.  Ավելին, մեր մոդելը բարելավում է երկար տեսակի համառոտագրությունների սերունդը երկար կառավարական զեկույցներից և Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածներից, ըստ ROUGe-ի գնահատականների:', 'az': "Döküman quruluşu müvəffəqiyyətli məlumat istifadəsi üçün kritik edir. Ancaq, bunu modern Transformer arhitektarına çox etkili olaraq kodlamaq çətindir. Bu işdə HIBRIDS'i göstəririk ki, hiyerarhikal Biases foR Yapılan Dökümat strukturunu dikkati nöqtəsi hesablamasına imkan verir. Daha sonra yeni bir işi, hiyerarşik sual-toplama nəsili göstərdik, mənbə dökümündə süslü məlumatlarını soruşma və toplama hiyerarşiyə çevirmək üçün, hər təqib sualının ata-anası sual-toplama çiftərinin məlumatlarını soruşur. Biz həmçinin hökumət raporlarında etiketlənmiş 6.153 sual qurğuları ilə yeni verilən qurğunu bildiririk. Experiment sonuçları göstərir ki modelimiz daha yaxşı sual-toplamlı hiyerarhiyatlarını həmçinin hiyerarhiyat kalitetindən və məlumat örtüklərindən karşılaşdırmaqdan daha yaxşı yaradır, insan yargıcıların də dəyişdirilməsi. Üstəlik, modellərimiz uzun hökumət raporlarından və Wikipedia məktublarından uzun-uzun quruluş nəsillərini yaxşılaşdırır, ROUGE nöqtələrindən ölçülür.", 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্ট কাঠামো কার্যকর তথ্য ব্যবহারের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। তবে এটা আধুনিক ট্রান্সফ্রান্সফারেন্স কাঠামোর মধ্যে কার্যকর করে এনকোড করতে চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা এইচব্রিডস উপস্থাপন করছি, যা হিয়েরার্কিল বায়েস ফোয়ার্কিং ডকুমেন্ট ক্ষেত্রে মনোযোগ স্কোর হিসেবে প্রবেশ করে। আমরা আরো একটি নতুন কাজ, হিয়ারার্কিল প্রশ্ন-সামার্কিক প্রজন্মের সাথে উপস্থিত করি, সূত্রের বিক্রেতার বিষয়বস্তু সংক্ষেপের জন্যে প্রশ্ন ও সামার্গারের সংক আমরা সরকারের প্রতিবেদনে চিহ্নিত ৬,১৫৩ প্রশ্নের সামার্চিক হিয়ারার্চি নিয়ে একটি নতুন তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্য পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল প্রশ্নের সামার্কিল হিয়েরার্কি তুলনার চেয়ে ভালো প্রশ্ন উৎপাদন করে, যা হিয়েরার্কি মান এবং বি এছাড়াও, আমাদের মডেল দীর্ঘ সরকারের রিপোর্ট এবং উইকিপিডিয়া প্রবন্ধের সারসংক্ষেপের প্রজন্ম উন্নত করে, যেমন রুজের স্কোর মাপ পরিম', 'bs': 'Struktura dokumenta je kritična za učinkovitu potrošnju informacija. Međutim, teško je kodirati ga efikasno u modernu arhitekturu transformera. U ovom poslu predstavljamo HIBRIDS, koji ubrizgava Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure u procjenu rezultata pažnje. Dalje predstavljamo novi zadatak, hijerarhička generacija i sažetak pitanja, za sažetak sadržaja salijanta u izvornom dokumentu u hijerarhiju pitanja i sažetaka, gdje svako pitanje za praćenje pita o sadržaju svog roditelja i sažetka pitanja. Također annotiramo novu podatku sa 6.153 hijerarhijom o sažetku pitanja označenim na izvještajima vlade. Rezultati eksperimenta pokazuju da naš model proizvodi bolje hijerarhije o sažetku pitanja nego usporedbe kvalitete hijerarhije i sadržaja, otkriće koje su također proglasili ljudski sudci. Osim toga, naš model poboljšava generaciju dugoroformnih sažetaka iz dugih izvještaja vlade i članaka Wikipedije, kako je mjereno od rezultata ROUGE-a.', 'ca': "L'estructura dels documents és crítica per a un consum eficient d'informació. Tanmateix, és difícil codificar-lo eficientment a l'arquitectura moderna Transformer. En aquest treball, presentem HIBRIDS, que injecta Biases Hierarchical foR Incorporating Document Structure en càlcul de puntuació d'atenció. També presentem una nova tasca, generació jeràrquica de resum de preguntes, per resumir el contingut salient del document de font en una jerarquia de preguntes i resums, on cada pregunta de seguiment pregunta sobre el contingut del seu parell de resum de preguntes. També anotem un nou conjunt de dades amb 6.153 jerarquies de resum de preguntes etiquetades en informes governamentals. Els resultats d'experiments demostren que el nostre model produeix millors jerarquies de resum de preguntes que comparacions sobre la qualitat de la jerarquia i la cobertura del contingut, una descoberta també ecolada pels jutges humans. A més, el nostre model millora la generació de resums de llarga forma a partir de llargs informes governamentals i articles de Wikipedia, segons les puntuacions ROUGE.", 'cs': 'Struktura dokumentů je klíčová pro efektivní spotřebu informací. Je však náročné jej efektivně zakódovat do moderní architektury Transformeru. V této práci představujeme HIBRIDS, který vkládá hierarchické předsudky pro začlenění struktury dokumentu do výpočtu skóre pozornosti. Dále představujeme nový úkol, hierarchické generování otázek-souhrn, pro shrnutí významného obsahu ve zdrojovém dokumentu do hierarchie otázek a souhrnů, kde každá navazující otázka se ptá na obsah svého nadřazeného dvojice otázek-souhrn. Také anotujeme novou datovou sadu s hierarchiemi souhrnu otázek 6,153 označenými ve vládních zprávách. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že náš model vytváří lepší hierarchie souhrnu otázek než srovnání jak kvality hierarchie, tak pokrytí obsahu. Navíc náš model zlepšuje generování dlouhodobých souhrnů z dlouhých vládních zpráv a článků Wikipedie, měřených pomocí ROUGE skóre.', 'et': 'Dokumentide struktuur on teabe tõhusaks tarbimiseks kriitilise tähtsusega. Siiski on keeruline kodeerida seda tõhusalt kaasaegsesse Transformeri arhitektuuri. Käesolevas töös tutvustame HIBRIDS-i, mis süstib hierarhilised kalduvused dokumentide struktuuri integreerimiseks tähelepanu skoori arvutamiseks. Lisaks tutvustame uut ülesannet, hierarhilist küsimuse-kokkuvõtte genereerimist lähtedokumendi olulise sisu kokkuvõtmiseks küsimuste ja kokkuvõtete hierarhiasse, kus iga järelküsimus küsib oma algküsimuse-kokkuvõtte paari sisu. Lisaks märgistame uut andmekogumit 6153 küsimuse kokkuvõtte hierarhiaga, mis on märgistatud valitsuse aruannetes. Eksperimentide tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel annab paremad küsimuste kokkuvõtte hierarhiad kui võrdlused nii hierarhiakvaliteedi kui ka sisu katvuse osas, mida kajastavad ka inimkohtunikud. Lisaks parandab meie mudel pikakujuliste kokkuvõtete loomist pikkadest valitsuse aruannetest ja Wikipedia artiklitest, mida mõõdetakse ROUGE skooridega.', 'fi': 'Asiakirjarakenne on ratkaisevan tärkeä tehokkaan tiedon kulutuksen kannalta. Sen tehokas koodaus moderniin Transformer-arkkitehtuuriin on kuitenkin haastavaa. Tässä työssä esitellään HIBRIDS, joka ruiskuttaa hierarkisia biases foR Incorporating Document Structure -mallin huomiopistelaskentaan. Lisäksi esittelemme uuden tehtävän, hierarkkisen kysymyksen ja yhteenvedon generoinnin, jossa lähdeasiakirjan keskeisen sisällön tiivistäminen kysymysten ja yhteenvedon hierarkiaan, jossa jokainen jatkokysymys kysyy sen pääkysymys-yhteenvedon sisältöä. Merkitsemme myös uuden aineiston, jossa on 6 153 kysymystä sisältävää tiivistelmähierarkiaa, jotka on merkitty hallituksen raportteihin. Kokemusten tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme tuottaa parempia kysymys-yhteenvetohierarkioita kuin vertailuja hierarkian laadusta ja sisällön kattavuudesta, mitä myös ihmistuomarit kaipasivat. Lisäksi mallimme parantaa pitkämuotoisten tiivistelmien tuottamista pitkistä hallituksen raporteista ja Wikipedia-artikkeleista ROUGE-pisteillä mitattuna.', 'sk': 'Struktura dokumentov je ključnega pomena za učinkovito porabo informacij. Vendar pa je težko učinkovito kodirati v sodobno arhitekturo transformatorjev. V tem delu predstavljamo HIBRIDS, ki vbrizga hierarhične pristranskosti za vključevanje strukture dokumentov v izračun ocene pozornosti. Nadalje predstavljamo novo nalogo, hierarhično generiranje vprašanj-povzetkov, za povzetek pomembne vsebine v izvornem dokumentu v hierarhijo vprašanj in povzetkov, kjer vsako nadaljnje vprašanje sprašuje o vsebini svojega matičnega vprašanja-povzetka. Zabeležimo tudi nov nabor podatkov s 6.153 hierarhijami povzetkov vprašanj, označenimi v vladnih poročilih. Rezultati eksperimentov kažejo, da naš model ustvarja boljše hierarhije povzetkov vprašanj kot primerjave hierarhije kakovosti hierarhije in pokritosti vsebine, kar odmevajo tudi človeški sodniki. Poleg tega naš model izboljšuje ustvarjanje dolgih povzetkov iz dolgih vladnih poročil in Wikipedijskih člankov, merjenih z rezultati ROUGE.', 'he': 'מבנה המסמכים הוא קריטי לצרכת מידע יעילה. עם זאת, זה מאתגר לקוד אותו באופן יעיל לארכיטקטורה המודרנית Transformer. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציגים HIBRIDS, אשר מזריק נזקים הייררכיים FR Incorporating Document Structure לחישוב נקודת תשומת לב. We further present a new task, hierarchical question-summary generation, for summarizing salient content in the source document into a hierarchy of questions and summaries, where each follow-up question inquires about the content of its parent question-summary pair.  אנו גם מצביעים קבוצת נתונים חדשה עם 6,153 הייררכיות בסכם שאלות שמתוויעות על דו"חות ממשלתיים. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שהמודל שלנו יוצר הייררכיות השאלות-סכם טובות יותר משוואות על איכות הייררכיה וכיסוי התוכן, מציאה שגם דופקת על ידי שופטים אנושיים. בנוסף, הדוגמא שלנו משפר את הדור של סדרות צורה ארוכה מדווחים ממשלתיים ארוכים ומאמרים בוויקיפדיה, כפי שמדוד על ידי נקודות ROUGE.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringClot Nanging, aku lan akeh lan akeh ngkode kuwi nggawe layang-pakan ning architecture Transformer modèrn. Nang gunggo iki, kéné mengko HIBOID S nggawe soko nggawe soko Jearacial Biase FoR Incomporation Dokumen structural kanggo ngaksu barang nggawe Pilot We tambah maneh da gawe data set dadi kanggo 6,500 question-digeste Perintah sing paling nggambar kuwi model nambah akeh suaraning-hasar karo urip nggawe geraraning nggawe barang karo kalitas karo perusahaan seneng nggawe Mungkin daftar, model nambah sing luwih-luwih dumateng kapan kelangan langgar sampek bantuan nggawe barang nggawe gerangkamu nggawe gerangkamu kelangan kelangan Rong egal', 'ha': "@ info: tooltip A lokacin haka, yana kanna kodi shi kafi mai fasahan matsayin na taƙaita. In this work, we present HIBRIDS, which injects Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure into attention score calculation.  Ko gaba da wani yanzu wa aikin da aka ƙara masu tambayar-muhimmi, don a sami ƙararin maɓallin sali cikin takardar source zuwa a hierrrchy of masu tambayar da ƙarami, inda duk tambayi na tambayi yana tambayar abin da ke cikin nau'in tambayar-nau'in da ke ƙara. Tuna buga wani sabo na takarda da 6,153 masu tambayar-muhimmi da aka sanar da shi a kan rubutun sarammaci. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da masu muhimmi masu tambayar-muhimmi daga misalin da misalin da tsari na hierrrchy da tsarin maɓallin, wani gani na sambata da mahakiman mutane. Ina ƙaranci, misalinmu yana ƙaranci ƙarami masu tsari na zaman shekara na gommaci na rubutun government na Wikiledia, kamar an ƙaddara na rubutun RUGE.", 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་ཕལ་ཆེན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནང་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་དགོས་མེད། In this work, we present HIBRIDS, which injects Hierarchical Biases foR Incorporating Document Structure into attention score calculation. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་དང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་བསྡུར་བ་ཅིག་གསར་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་དགོས། ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་གི་salient་ནང་དོན་རྣམ་པ་དང་བསྡུ We also annotate a new data set with 6,153 question-summary hierarchies labeled on government reports. Experiment results show that our model produces better question-summary hierarchies than comparisons on both hierarchy quality and content coverage, a finding also echoed by human judges. Additionally, our model improves the generation of long-form summaries from long government reports and Wikipedia articles, as measured by ROUGE scores.'}
{'en': 'An Investigation of the (In)effectiveness of Counterfactually Augmented Data', 'ar': 'إزالة التحيز للاستخراج التوليدي في مهمة NER الموحدة', 'es': 'Eliminación de sesgos para la extracción generativa en la tarea unificada de NER', 'fr': "De-bias pour l'extraction générative dans une tâche NER unifiée", 'pt': 'De-Bias para extração generativa na tarefa NER unificada', 'ja': 'Unified NERタスクでの生成抽出のためのDe - Bias', 'zh': '一 NER 事,提去倚', 'ru': 'De-Bias для генеративной экстракции в унифицированной задаче NER', 'hi': 'एकीकृत एनईआर कार्य में उत्पादक निष्कर्षण के लिए डी-पूर्वाग्रह', 'ga': 'Díchlaonadh le haghaidh Eastóscadh Giniteach i dTasc NER Aontaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'De-Bias a generációs extrakcióhoz az egységes NER feladatban', 'el': 'Απο-Bias για Generative Extraction σε ενοποιημένη εργασία NER', 'it': "De-Bias per l'estrazione generativa in Unified NER Task", 'kk': 'Біріктірілген NER тапсырмасындағы құрылған тарқату үшін бөлшектері', 'lt': 'De-Bias for Generative Extraction in Unified NER Task', 'mk': 'Де- Bias за генеративна екстракција во унифицираната задача NER', 'ms': 'Des-Bias untuk Ekstraksi Generatif dalam Tugas NER Bersatu', 'ml': 'ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പുതിയ ജോലിയില്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡി- ബിയാസ്', 'mt': 'De Bias għall-Estrazzjoni Ġenerattiva f’Kompitu Unifikat NER', 'mn': 'Нэгдсэн NER Task-д Generative Extraction-ын De-Bias', 'no': 'De-Bias for generert utpakking i unisert NER- oppgåve', 'pl': 'De-Bias dla ekstrakcji generacyjnej w jednolitym zadaniu NER', 'ro': 'De-Bias pentru extracția generativă în sarcina NER unificată', 'sr': 'De-Bias za generativno izvlačenje u jedinstvenom NER zadatku', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ NER කාර්යේ සිද්ධිය පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳින්න', 'so': 'De-Bias for Generative Extraction in Unified NER Task', 'ta': 'ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட புதிய பணியில் உருவாக்குதலுக்கான டே- பியாஸ்', 'sv': 'De-Bias för generativ extraktion i Unified NER Task', 'ur': 'یونیفڈ نیر ٹاکس میں پیدا کرنے کے لئے دوبیاس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'De- Bians để đào tạo thành quả trong tối hợp nhất', 'da': 'De-Bias til genererende udvinding i Unified NER Task', 'bg': 'Де-Bias за генеративно извличане в унифицирана задача NER', 'de': 'De-Bias für die generative Extraktion in Unified NER Task', 'hr': 'De-Bias za generativno izvlačenje u jedinstvenom NER zadatku', 'nl': 'De-Bias voor Generatieve Extractie in Unified NER Task', 'id': 'De Bias untuk Ekstraksi Generatif dalam Tugas NER Unified', 'ko': 'NER 퀘스트에서 생성성 추출의 편향 제거 통일', 'sw': 'De-Bias kwa ajili ya kutengenezwa kwa Kizalendo katika kazi ya NNE', 'af': 'De- Bias vir Genereerde Uitpakking in Unified NER Opdrag', 'sq': 'De Bias për ekstraksionin gjenerativ në detyrën e unifikuar NER', 'tr': 'Birleşik NER zadynda janlaşdyrma üçin beýik-beýik', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'fa': 'دوبیا برای استخراج نسل در کار NER متحد', 'hy': 'De-Bias for Generative Extraction in Unified NER Task', 'az': 'Birləşdirilmiş NER işində Generativ Extraction üçün De-Bias', 'bn': 'একত্রিত নতুন কাজের জন্য প্রজেনেটিভ এক্সট্র্যাকশনের ডি- বিয়াস', 'bs': 'De-Bias za generativno izvlačenje u jedinstvenom NER zadatku', 'ca': "Desbias per a l'extracció generativa en la tasca unificada NER", 'cs': 'De-Bias pro generační extrakci v jednotném NER úkolu', 'et': 'Generatiivse ekstraheerimise vähendamine ühtses NER ülesandes', 'fi': 'Epäbias generatiiviselle uuttamiselle yhtenäisessä NER-tehtävässä', 'jv': 'DEBias kanggo Generve extract kanggo Uniified NeR task', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Unified NER Task ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པར་De-Bias', 'sk': 'DeBias za generativno ekstrakcijo v enotni nalogi NER', 'he': 'De-Bias for Generative Extraction in Unified NER Task'}
{'en': 'While pretrained language models achieve excellent performance on natural language understanding benchmarks, they tend to rely on spurious correlations and generalize poorly to out-of-distribution (OOD) data. Recent work has explored using counterfactually-augmented data (CAD)—data generated by minimally perturbing examples to flip the ground-truth label—to identify robust features that are invariant under distribution shift. However, empirical results using CAD during training for OOD generalization have been mixed. To explain this discrepancy, through a toy theoretical example and empirical analysis on two crowdsourced CAD datasets, we show that: (a) while features perturbed in CAD are indeed robust features, it may prevent the model from learning unperturbed robust features; and (b) CAD may exacerbate existing spurious correlations in the data. Our results thus show that the lack of perturbation diversity limits CAD’s effectiveness on OOD generalization, calling for innovative crowdsourcing procedures to elicit diverse perturbation of examples.', 'ar': 'يعد التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) مهمة أساسية للتعرف على أنواع معينة من الكيانات من جملة معينة. اعتمادًا على كيفية ظهور الكيانات في الجملة ، يمكن تقسيمها إلى ثلاث مهام فرعية ، وهي Flat NER و Nested NER و Discontinuous NER. من بين الأساليب الحالية ، يمكن تكييف النموذج التوليدي فقط بشكل موحد لهذه المهام الفرعية الثلاث. ومع ذلك ، عندما يتم تطبيق النموذج التوليدي على NER ، فإن هدف التحسين الخاص به لا يتوافق مع المهمة ، مما يجعل النموذج عرضة للتحيزات غير الصحيحة. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتحليل التحيزات غير الصحيحة في عملية التوليد من منظور السببية وننسبها إلى اثنين من المربكين: مُحيط السياق المسبق ومربك ترتيب الكيان. علاوة على ذلك ، نصمم طرق زيادة تفكيك البيانات داخل الكيانات وفيما بين الكيانات للتخلص من الإرباكات المذكورة أعلاه وفقًا لنظرية تعديل الباب الخلفي. تظهر التجارب أن طريقتنا يمكن أن تحسن أداء نموذج NER التوليدي في مجموعات البيانات المختلفة.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) est une tâche fondamentale pour reconnaître des types spécifiques d'entités à partir d'une phrase donnée. Selon la façon dont les entités apparaissent dans la phrase, celle-ci peut être divisée en trois sous-tâches, à savoir\xa0: NER plat, NER imbriqué et NER discontinu. Parmi les approches existantes, seul le modèle génératif peut être uniformément adapté à ces trois sous-tâches. Cependant, lorsque le modèle génératif est appliqué à NER, son objectif d'optimisation n'est pas cohérent avec la tâche, ce qui rend le modèle vulnérable aux biais incorrects. Dans cet article, nous analysons les biais incorrects dans le processus de génération du point de vue de la causalité et les attribuons à deux facteurs de confusion\xa0: le confusionneur pré-contexte et le confusionneur entité-ordre. En outre, nous concevons des méthodes d'augmentation des données de déconfusion intra-entités et inter-entités afin d'éliminer les facteurs de confusion ci-dessus selon la théorie de l'ajustement backdoor. Les expériences montrent que notre méthode peut améliorer les performances du modèle NER génératif dans divers ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'O reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas (NER) é uma tarefa fundamental para reconhecer tipos específicos de entidades de uma determinada frase. Dependendo de como as entidades aparecem na frase, ela pode ser dividida em três subtarefas, a saber, NER plano, NER aninhado e NER descontínuo. Dentre as abordagens existentes, apenas o modelo generativo pode ser adaptado uniformemente a essas três subtarefas. No entanto, quando o modelo generativo é aplicado ao NER, seu objetivo de otimização não é consistente com a tarefa, o que torna o modelo vulnerável a vieses incorretos. Neste artigo, analisamos os vieses incorretos no processo de geração a partir de uma perspectiva de causalidade e os atribuímos a dois fatores de confusão: confundidor pré-contexto e confundidor entidade-ordem. Além disso, projetamos métodos de aumento de dados de desconfusão intra e interentidade para eliminar os fatores de confusão acima de acordo com a teoria do ajuste de backdoor. Experimentos mostram que nosso método pode melhorar o desempenho do modelo generativo de NER em vários conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'El reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) es una tarea fundamental para reconocer tipos específicos de entidades a partir de una oración determinada. Dependiendo de cómo aparezcan las entidades en la oración, se puede dividir en tres subtareas, a saber, NER plana, NER anidada y NER discontinua. Entre los enfoques existentes, solo el modelo generativo se puede adaptar de manera uniforme a estas tres subtareas. Sin embargo, cuando el modelo generativo se aplica a NER, su objetivo de optimización no es coherente con la tarea, lo que hace que el modelo sea vulnerable a los sesgos incorrectos. En este artículo, analizamos los sesgos incorrectos en el proceso de generación desde una perspectiva de causalidad y los atribuimos a dos factores de confusión: el confundidor precontexto y el factor de confusión entidad-orden. Además, diseñamos métodos de aumento de datos de desconfusión intra e interentidad para eliminar los factores de confusión anteriores de acuerdo con la teoría del ajuste de puerta trasera. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro método puede mejorar el rendimiento del modelo de NER generativo en varios conjuntos de datos.', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）は、与えられた文章から特定のタイプのエンティティを認識するための基本的なタスクです。 エンティティが文章にどのように表示されるかに応じて、フラットNER、ネストNER、不連続NERの3つのサブタスクに分けられます。 既存のアプローチの中で、生成モデルのみがこれら3つのサブタスクに一様に適応できる。 しかし、生成モデルをNERに適用すると、その最適化目標がタスクと一致しないため、モデルは誤ったバイアスに弱くなります。 本稿では，生成過程における誤ったバイアスを因果関係の観点から分析し，プレコンテキストコンファウンダーとエンティティ-オーダーコンファウンダーの2つの混同因子に帰着する． さらに、バックドア調整の理論に従って上記の混乱を排除するために、イントラおよびエンティティ間のデコンファウンディングデータ拡張方法を設計します。 実験は、本方法が様々なデータセットにおける生成NERモデルのパフォーマンスを向上させることができることを示している。', 'hi': 'नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) किसी दिए गए वाक्य से विशिष्ट प्रकार की संस्थाओं को पहचानने के लिए एक मौलिक कार्य है। इस बात पर निर्भर करता है कि वाक्य में एंटिटी कैसे दिखाई देती हैं, इसे तीन उप-कार्यों में विभाजित किया जा सकता है, अर्थात्, फ्लैट एनईआर, नेस्टेड एनईआर और असंतत एनईआर। मौजूदा दृष्टिकोणों में से, केवल उत्पादक मॉडल को समान रूप से इन तीन उप-कार्यों के लिए अनुकूलित किया जा सकता है। हालांकि, जब उत्पादक मॉडल एनईआर पर लागू होता है, तो इसका अनुकूलन उद्देश्य कार्य के अनुरूप नहीं होता है, जो मॉडल को गलत पूर्वाग्रहों के लिए कमजोर बनाता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक कार्यकारणता परिप्रेक्ष्य से पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया में गलत पूर्वाग्रहों का विश्लेषण करते हैं और उन्हें दो confounders के लिए विशेषता देते हैं: पूर्व-संदर्भ confounder और इकाई-आदेश confounder। इसके अलावा, हम पिछले दरवाजे के समायोजन के सिद्धांत के अनुसार उपरोक्त confounders को खत्म करने के लिए इंट्रा- और इंटर-एंटिटी Deconfounding Data Augmentation विधियों को डिजाइन करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि विभिन्न डेटासेट में उत्पादक एनईआर मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में सुधार कर सकती है।', 'zh': '名实者 (NER) 给定句之特定体也。 据实体句中显示方式,可分为三子,扁平 NER、嵌套 NER 、不续 NER。 于今有法,惟生成模可以一适三子。 然当生成模型用于 NER ,其优化异务,则易偏也。 夫本文者,以因果关系论差,而以两归因于杂之:前上下文混杂以素与实体相杂也。 又设实体内、实体间去创始数增强之法,以据后门调理消除。 实验者,所以成也NER所以成数也。', 'ru': 'Распознавание именованных сущностей (NER) является фундаментальной задачей для распознавания определенных типов сущностей из данного предложения. В зависимости от того, как сущности отображаются в предложении, его можно разделить на три подзадачи, а именно Flat NER, Nested NER и Discontinuous NER. Среди существующих подходов только генеративная модель может быть единообразно адаптирована к этим трем подзадачам. Однако, когда генеративная модель применяется к NER, ее цель оптимизации не согласуется с задачей, что делает модель уязвимой к некорректным смещениям. В этой статье мы анализируем некорректные ошибки в процессе генерации с точки зрения причинно-следственной связи и относим их к двум искажающим факторам: предконтекстному искажающему фактору и искажающему фактору порядка сущности. Кроме того, мы разрабатываем методы внутри- и межсубъектного расширения данных для устранения вышеуказанных искажающих факторов в соответствии с теорией настройки бэкдора. Эксперименты показывают, что наш метод может улучшить производительность генеративной модели NER в различных наборах данных.', 'ga': 'Is tasc bunúsach é aithint eintitis ainmnithe (NER) chun cineálacha sonracha eintiteas a aithint ó abairt ar leith. Ag brath ar an gcaoi a bhfuil na heintitis le feiceáil san abairt, is féidir é a roinnt ina thrí fhothasc, mar atá, Flat NER, Nested NER, agus Discontinuous NER. I measc na gcur chuige atá ann faoi láthair, ní féidir ach an tsamhail ghiniúna a oiriúnú go haonfhoirmeach do na trí fhothasc seo. Mar sin féin, nuair a chuirtear an tsamhail ghiniúna i bhfeidhm ar NER, níl a chuspóir leas iomlán a bhaint comhsheasmhach leis an tasc, rud a fhágann go bhfuil an tsamhail leochaileach do na laofachtaí mícheart. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid anailís ar na laofachtaí míchearta sa phróiseas giniúna ó pheirspictíocht cúisíochta de agus cuirimid i leith dhá chomhbhunaitheoir iad: comhbhunaitheoir réamh-chomhthéacs agus comhbhunaitheoir ordú aonáin. Ina theannta sin, dearaimid modhanna Méadaithe Sonraí Díbhréagnaithe laistigh agus Idir-eintiteas chun deireadh a chur leis na confounders thuas de réir theoiric an choigeartú backdoor. Léiríonn turgnaimh gur féidir lenár modh feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht na samhla ginideach NER i dtacar sonraí éagsúla.', 'ka': 'სახელი ინტერტის განაცნობა (NER) არის ფუნდამეტური რაოდენობა, რომელიც განაცნობა განსაკუთრებული ტიპი ინტერტიების განაცნობაში. განმავლობით, როგორ ინტერტიები ჩვენებენ წესში, შეიძლება გაყოფილი სამი წესში, ანუ, Flat NER, Nested NER, და გადაწყვეტილი NER. მხოლოდ გენერაციური მოდელის შორის ერთადერთად შეიძლება ამ სამი სექტაციებისთვის აეპორტირება. თუმცა, როდესაც გენერაციური მოდელი NER-ზე აყენებულია, მისი ოპტიმიზაციის მიზეზი არ არის დავალებით, რომელიც მოდელის შეცდომა მუშაობელია. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ შეცდომა წარმოდგენების პროცესში წარმოდგენების შეცდომა პროცესიდან და ატრიბუტირებით ორი კონფექტური: წინ-კონტექსტური კონფექტური და ინტე დამატებით, ჩვენ ინტერე- და ინტერენტიკური ინტერექტიკური ინტერექტიკური განაკონფიგურაციის მონაცემები აგგენტიკური მეტოვების გამოყენება, რომელიც ჩემი წინ დაკავშირ ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი შეუძლიათ განსხვავებული მონაცემენტების მოდელს წარმოდგენება.', 'hu': 'A nevezett entitások felismerése (NER) alapvető feladat egy adott mondatból való felismeréséhez. Attól függően, hogy az entitások hogyan jelennek meg a mondatban, ez három alcsoportra osztható, nevezetesen Flat NER, Nested NER és Discontinous NER. A meglévő megközelítések közül csak a generációs modell lehet egységesen alkalmazkodni ehhez a három alterülethez. A generációs modell alkalmazásakor azonban a NER optimalizálási célkitűzése nem összhangban van a feladattal, ami sebezhetővé teszi a modellt a helytelen előítéletekkel szemben. Ebben a tanulmányban a generációs folyamat helytelen elfogultságait okozati szempontból elemezzük, és két összekeverőnek tulajdonítjuk: pre-context confounder és entitás-rend confounder. Ezenkívül a hátsó ajtók beállításának elmélete szerint tervezünk Intra- és Interentity Deconfiunding Data Augmentation módszereket, hogy kiküszöböljük a fenti zavarokat. Kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk javíthatja a generációs NER modell teljesítményét különböző adatkészletekben.', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας (ΝΕΡ) είναι μια θεμελιώδης αποστολή αναγνώρισης συγκεκριμένων τύπων οντοτήτων από μια δεδομένη πρόταση. Ανάλογα με το πώς εμφανίζονται οι οντότητες στην πρόταση, μπορεί να χωριστεί σε τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες, δηλαδή, επίπεδη ΝΕΡ, φωλιασμένη και μη συνεχόμενη ΝΕΡ. Μεταξύ των υφιστάμενων προσεγγίσεων, μόνο το παραγωγικό μοντέλο μπορεί να προσαρμοστεί ομοιόμορφα σε αυτές τις τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Ωστόσο, όταν το παραγωγικό μοντέλο εφαρμόζεται στο Ο στόχος βελτιστοποίησης του δεν είναι συνεπής με την εργασία, γεγονός που καθιστά το μοντέλο ευάλωτο στις λανθασμένες προκαταλήψεις. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναλύουμε τις λανθασμένες προκατάληψη στη διαδικασία παραγωγής από μια προοπτική αιτιώδους συνάφειας και τις αποδίδουμε σε δύο παράγοντες που προκαλούν σύγχυση: τον προ-περιβάλλοντος σύγχυση και τον ανασταλτικό οντότητας-τάξης. Επιπλέον, σχεδιάζουμε μεθόδους αύξησης δεδομένων εντός και μεταξύ οντοτήτων για την εξάλειψη των παραπάνω διαταραχών σύμφωνα με τη θεωρία της προσαρμογής πίσω πόρτας. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας μπορεί να βελτιώσει την απόδοση του παραγωγικού μοντέλου σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'it': "Il riconoscimento di entità denominate (NER) è un compito fondamentale per riconoscere tipi specifici di entità da una data frase. A seconda di come appaiono le entità nella frase, può essere divisa in tre sottoattività, vale a dire, Flat NER, Nested NER e Discontinuous NER. Tra gli approcci esistenti, solo il modello generativo può essere adattato uniformemente a queste tre sottoattività. Tuttavia, quando il modello generativo viene applicato a NER, il suo obiettivo di ottimizzazione non è coerente con il compito, il che rende il modello vulnerabile ai pregiudizi errati. In questo articolo analizziamo i pregiudizi errati nel processo di generazione da una prospettiva di causalità e li attribuiamo a due confounder: confounder pre-contesto e confounder entità-ordine. Inoltre, progettiamo metodi di deconfending Data Augmentation Intra e Inter-entity per eliminare i confounder di cui sopra secondo la teoria dell'aggiustamento backdoor. Esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro metodo può migliorare le prestazioni del modello NER generativo in vari set di dati.", 'mk': 'Признавањето на именуваниот ентитет (NER) е фундаментална задача за признавање на специфични типови на ентитети од одредена реченица. Во зависност од тоа како ентитетите се појавуваат во реченицата, истиот може да се подели на три потпрашања, имено, Плата НЕР, Неседната НЕР и Неконтинуирана НЕР. Меѓу постојните пристапи, само генерацискиот модел може да биде униформно адаптиран на овие три потпрашања. Сепак, кога генеративниот модел се применува на НЕР, нејзината оптимизациска цел не е во согласност со задачата, што го прави моделот ранлив на неправилните предрасуди. In this paper, we analyze the incorrect biases in the generation process from a causality perspective and attribute them to two confounders: pre-context confounder and entity-order confounder.  Покрај тоа, дизајнираме методи за деконфункционирање на податоците за да ги елиминираме наведените збунувачи според теоријата за прилагодување на задната врата. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот метод може да ја подобри резултатот на генеративниот модел НЕР во различни податоци.', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) келтірілген сөйлемеден арнаулы нысандарды анықтау үшін негізгі тапсырма. Сөздегі бөліктердің қалай көрінісіне тәуелді, бұл үш суретке бөліледі, мысалы: Flat NER, Nested NER және NER дегенге бөліледі. Бар жағдайлардың арасында тек генерациялық модель бұл үш суреттерге бірдей адаптау болады. Бірақ жасау үлгісі NER- ге қолданылса, оның оптимизациялау мақсаты тапсырмасына сәйкес келмейді. Бұл үлгісі дұрыс тәртіпсіздерге қауіпсіз болады. Бұл қағазда, біз құру процесінде дұрыс қарсылығын себептердің көзінен анализ және оларды екі қарсылыққа атрибуттаймыз: алдын- контексті көзгертуші және нысандардың ретін көзгертуші. Қосымша, біз ішкі және ішкі құрылғының артықшылық түзету теориясына сәйкес, жоғардағы құрылғыларды өшіру үшін деректерді көшірмелеу әдістерін құрамыз. Тәжірибелер біздің әдіміміз NER үлгісін түрлі деректер жиындарында жасай алады.', 'lt': 'Pavadintojo subjekto pripažinimas (NER) yra pagrindinė užduotis pripažinti konkrečių tipų subjektus iš tam tikro sakinio. Atsižvelgiant į tai, kaip subjektai nurodomi sakinyje, jis gali būti padalintas į tris paklausimus, būtent: Flat NER, Nested NER ir Discontinuous NER. Iš esamų metodų tik kartinis modelis gali būti vienodai pritaikytas prie šių trijų paklausų. Tačiau, kai generacinis model is taikomas NER, jo optimizavimo tikslas neatitinka užduočių, dėl kurių modelis yra pažeidžiamas neteisingoms nukreipimams. Šiame dokumente analizuojame neteisingus sąlyžius gamybos procese priežastinio ryšio požiūriu ir priskiriame juos dviem susipainiavėjams: ikikontekstiniam susipainiavėjui ir subjekto tvarkos susipainiavėjui. Be to, mes sukuriame duomenų didinimo metodus, skirtus pašalinti pirmiau minėtus sukrėtimus pagal galinių durų reguliavimo teoriją. Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas gali pagerinti generacinio NER modelio veiksmingumą įvairiuose duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) adalah tugas asas untuk mengenali jenis entiti khusus dari kalimat tertentu. Bergantung pada bagaimana entiti muncul dalam kalimat, ia boleh dibahagi menjadi tiga sub-tanya, iaitu, Flat NER, Nested NER, dan Discontinuous NER. Antara pendekatan yang wujud, hanya model generatif boleh disesuaikan secara serentak kepada tiga sub-tanya ini. Namun, apabila model generatif dilaksanakan kepada NER, objektif optimizasinya tidak konsisten dengan tugas, yang membuat model rentan terhadap biases yang salah. Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis biases yang salah dalam proses generasi dari sudut pandang penyebab dan atribut kepada dua penyebab: pre-konteks kekacauan dan entity-order kekacauan. Selain itu, kami merancang kaedah Penyahbunuhan Data Intra- dan Inter-entity untuk menghapuskan kekacauan di atas menurut teori penyesuaian pintu belakang. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita boleh meningkatkan prestasi model NER generatif dalam pelbagai set data.', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട വസ്തുവിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതു് (NER) നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പ്രത്യേക തരം വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രത വാക്കിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുന്നതെന്ന് ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നത്, അത് മൂന്നു ഉപജോലികളായി വിഭാഗിക്കാം, ഫ്ല നിലവിലുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളില്\u200d മാത്രമേ ജനറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഈ മൂന്നു സബ്ട്ട്സുകള്\u200dക്ക് മാറ്റാന്\u200d കഴിയൂ. എന്നാലും ജനറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d NER-ല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അതിന്റെ ഐച്ഛികമേഷനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം ജോലിയോടൊപ്പം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായിട്ടില്ല, അതിന്റെ മോ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d തലമുറയിലെ തെറ്റായ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും തെറ്റായ പിഴവുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കാര്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ കാഴ്ചപ്പാടില അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഇന്റ്രാവും ഇന്റര്\u200d സാധാരണ ഡേറ്റാ ഓഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നിലെ വാതില്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിന്റെ തിയറ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ജനറല്\u200d നെയിന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa (NER) huwa kompitu fundamentali li jiġu rikonoxxuti tipi speċifiċi ta’ entitajiet minn sentenza partikolari. Skont kif jidhru l-entitajiet fis-sentenza, din tista’ tinqasam fi tliet sottomistoqsijiet, jiġifieri, NER Flat, NER Nested, u NER Discontinuous. Fost l-approċċi eżistenti, il-mudell ġenerattiv biss jista’ jiġi adattat b’mod uniformi għal dawn it-tliet sottomistoqsijiet. Madankollu, meta l-mudell ġenerattiv jiġi applikat għan-NER, l-objettiv ta’ ottimizzazzjoni tiegħu mhuwiex konsistenti mal-kompitu, li jagħmel il-mudell vulnerabbli għall-preġudizzji skorretti. F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu analiżi tal-pre ġudizzji inkorretti fil-proċess ta’ ġenerazzjoni minn perspettiva ta’ kawżalità u attribwihom lil żewġ konfużuri: konfużur pre-kuntest u konfużur bejn entitajiet u ordni. Barra minn hekk, aħna niddisinjaw metodi ta’ Aġġustament tad-Dejta ta’ Dikonfederazzjoni ta’ Intra u Interentitajiet biex jeliminaw il-konfużjonijiet ta’ hawn fuq skont it-teorija tal-aġġustament tad-dahar. L-esperimenti juru li l-metodu tagħna jista’ jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-mudell ġenerattiv NER f’settijiet ta’ dejta varji.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek (NER) jest podstawowym zadaniem rozpoznawania konkretnych typów jednostek z danego zdania. W zależności od tego, jak występują one w zdaniu, można je podzielić na trzy podzadania, a mianowicie Płaski NER, Zagnieżdżony NER i Niekontynuacyjny NER. Wśród istniejących podejść jedynie model generatywny może być jednolitie dostosowany do tych trzech podzadań. Jednak kiedy model generatywny jest stosowany do NER, jego cel optymalizacji nie jest zgodny z zadaniem, co sprawia, że model jest podatny na nieprawidłowe uprzedzenia. W niniejszym artykule analizujemy nieprawidłowe uprzedzenia w procesie generowania z perspektywy przyczynowości i przypisujemy je do dwóch konfounderów: konfoundera pre-kontekstowego i confoundera porządku jednostek. Ponadto projektujemy metody rozszerzenia danych wewnątrz- i między jednostkami w celu wyeliminowania powyższych confounderów zgodnie z teorią korekty tylnych drzwi. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasza metoda może poprawić wydajność generatywnego modelu NER w różnych zbiorach danych.', 'mn': 'Нэр нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийн таних (НЕР) бол өгөгдсөн өгүүлбэрээс тодорхой төрлийн бүтээлүүдийг таних үндсэн ажил юм. Объектуудын хэрхэн харагдах вэ гэдэгт хамааралтай гэвэл энэ нь гурван дотор асуудлыг хувааж болно гэсэн үг: Flat NER, Nested NER болон СОХ-ын дотор. Өнөөдөр байгаа ойлголтын дунд зөвхөн үйлдвэрлэлийн загвар нь эдгээр гурван суурь суурь загваруудыг нэгтхэн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой. Гэхдээ үүсгэн загвар НЕР-д хэрэглэгддэг үед, үүнийг сайжруулах зорилго нь даалгавартай тэнцүү байхгүй. Энэ загварыг буруу байдалд эмзэг болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүүхдүүдийн хувьд буруу ойлголтыг шалгаж, үүнийг хоёр алдагдуулагч хүмүүст тайлбарлаж байна: өмнө нөхцөл байдлын алдагдал, биетийн дарааллын алдагдал. Мөн бид Intra-and Inter-entity Deconfounding Data Augmentation methods to eliminate the above confounders according to the theory of backdoor adjustment. Түүнчлэл бидний арга нь олон өгөгдлийн санд бий болгон NER загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Namnet entitetskjenning (NER) er ein grunnleggjande oppgåve for å gjenkjenna spesifikke typar entiteter frå eit gitt setning. Avhengig av korleis entiteten dukkar opp i setninga, kan det bli delt opp i tre underspørsmål, som er Flat NER, Nested NER og Stoppa NER. Mellom dei eksisterande tilnærmingane kan berre den genererige modellen brukast til desse tre underspørsmålene. Når det genererte modellen vert brukt til NER, er det optimaliseringsmålet ikkje konsistent med oppgåva, som gjer modellen sårbar til feil forsikringar. I denne papiret analyserer vi feil forskyvingane i genereringsprosessen frå ein forårsakelspektiv og attribuerer dei til to konfonderande: før-kontekst konfonderande og entitetsrekkefølgjer. I tillegg designerer vi interne- og Interentitetsmetodar som dekonfonderer dataaugmentasjon for å eliminere dei øvste konfonderande etter teorien om tilbakedørjustering. Eksperimentar viser at metoden vårt kan forbetra utviklinga av generativt NER-modell i ulike datasett.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) este o sarcină fundamentală pentru a recunoaște anumite tipuri de entități dintr-o anumită propoziție. În funcție de modul în care entitățile apar în propoziție, aceasta poate fi împărțită în trei subactivități, și anume, Flat NER, Nested NER și Discontinuous NER. Printre abordările existente, numai modelul generativ poate fi adaptat uniform acestor trei subsarcini. Cu toate acestea, atunci când modelul generativ este aplicat la NER, obiectivul său de optimizare nu este în concordanță cu sarcina, ceea ce face modelul vulnerabil la prejudecățile incorecte. În această lucrare, analizăm prejudecățile incorecte în procesul de generare din perspectiva cauzalității și le atribuim doi confounderi: confounder pre-context și confounder entitate-ordine. Mai mult decât atât, proiectăm metode de deconfigurare a datelor intra- și inter-entități pentru a elimina confounderii de mai sus conform teoriei ajustării ușilor din spate. Experimentele arată că metoda noastră poate îmbunătăți performanța modelului generativ NER în diferite seturi de date.', 'si': 'නම් තියෙන අයිතික අඳුරන්න (NER) මූලික වැඩක් විශේෂ වර්ගයක් දැනගන්න විශේෂ වර්ගයක් දැනගන්න. වාක්ෂාවෙන් ඉන්න තියෙන්නේ කොහොමද කියලා විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන්, කියන්නේ, Flat NER, Nest NER, සහ අවස්ථාවක් NER. සිද්ධ වෙන්න තියෙන ප්\u200dරවේශනය අතර, සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාවක් විතරයි මෙම ප්\u200dරවේශනය තුනක් විතරයි. නමුත්, නිර්මාණික මදුල NER වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙනකොට, එයාගේ විශේෂණ අක්ෂේපයක් වෙනුවෙන් නැහැ, ඒක නිර්මා මේ පත්තරේ අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා කාරණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණයක් වලින් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් ඉතින්, අපි ඉන්ත්\u200dරා සහ අන්තර්ජාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්නේ දත්ත විශාලනය විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න, පස්සේ දොර සැකසුම් විද්\u200dයාපනය සඳ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ විදියට විවිධ දත්ත සේට් වල සිදුවෙන NER නිර්මාණයේ ප්\u200dරභාව වැ', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada qofka la magacaabay (NER) waa shaqo aasaasi ah oo lagu aqoonsado noocyo cayiman oo lagu qoray. Waxay ku xiran tahay sida ay xuquuqda dhamaanku u muuqan karaan, waxaa lagu qeybin karaa saddex shabakad, kuwaas oo ah Shabakadda Duhurka ah, Nested NEA iyo SNE aan sii soconayn. Dhaqdooyinka joogta ah waxaa ka mid ah tusaalahan geneeral oo kaliya loola beddeli karo saddexdan shaqo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, marka lagu codsado muusikada geneeral ee NER, goalkiisu ma ahan mid la mid ah shaqada, kaasoo sameynaya modellka si khalad ah u halista tababarada. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku baaraynaa tababarada khaladda ah ee qarniga, waxaana ka dhigaynaa aragtida rasmiga ah, waxaana ka dhigaynaa laba isku mid ah: hoos-hoos-hoos iyo hoos-socodka jidhka. Furthermore, waxaynu qoraynaa qaababka kordhiska macluumaadka ee danaha iyo Internetka, si aan u elino qofka sare si waafaqsan fikrada hagitaanka bakhtiga. Imtixaanka waxaa muujin kara in qaabkanagu uu kordhin karo sameynta muusikada dhaqaalaha NER ee ku yaal sawirada kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Namngivn entitetsigenkänning (NER) är en grundläggande uppgift för att känna igen specifika typer av entiteter från en given mening. Beroende på hur entiteterna visas i meningen kan den delas in i tre underuppgifter, nämligen Flat NER, Nested NER och Discontinuous NER. Bland de befintliga tillvägagångssätten kan endast den generativa modellen anpassas enhetligt till dessa tre deluppgifter. Men när den generativa modellen tillämpas på NER är dess optimeringsmål inte förenligt med uppgiften, vilket gör modellen sårbar för felaktiga fördomar. I denna uppsats analyserar vi felaktiga fördomar i genereringsprocessen ur ett kausalitetsperspektiv och tillskriver dem två förvirrande: pre-context confounder och entitet-order confounder. Dessutom utformar vi metoder för att eliminera ovanstående förvirrande faktorer enligt teorin om backdoor justering. Experiment visar att vår metod kan förbättra prestandan hos den generativa NER-modellen i olika datauppsättningar.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) je osnovni zadatak prepoznati specifične vrste entiteta iz određene rečenice. Zavisi o tome kako se entiteti pojavljuju u rečenici, može se podijeliti na tri podataka, a to je Flat NER, Nested NER i prekinuti NER. Među postojećim pristupima, samo generativni model može biti uniformno prilagođen ovim tri podmetaka. Međutim, kad se generativni model primjenjuje na NER, njegov optimizacijski cilj nije u skladu sa zadatkom, što čini model ranjivim na nepravde predrasude. U ovom papiru analiziramo nepravde predrasude u procesu generacije iz perspektive uzrokovanja i pripisujemo ih dvojici zbunjenika: suzbunjenik pre konteksta i zbunjenik reda entiteta. Osim toga, mi dizajniramo metode povećanja podataka unutrašnjih i međusubjekta kako bi eliminisali iznad spojivača prema teoriji prilagodbe stražnjih vrata. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš metod može poboljšati učinkovitost generativnog modela NER u različitim podacima.', 'ta': 'பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்கியத்திலிருந்து குறிப்பிட்ட வகையான பொருள் அடிப்படையான செயல் வாக்கியத்தில் உள்ள பொருள்கள் எப்படி தெரியும் என்பதை சார்ந்து, அது மூன்று துணை பணிகளாக பிரிக்கலாம், பிளாட் NER, Nested NER மற்றும் தொடர்ந இருக்கும் முறைகளில், இந்த மூன்று துணை பணிகளுக்கு மட்டும் பொதுவான மாதிரி மட்டும் ஒப்பிட முடியும். However, the generative model is applied to NER, its optimization objective is not consistent with the task, which makes the model vulnerable to the wrong biases. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு காரணத்திலிருந்து தவறான பிரச்சினைகளை பரிசோதிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் அவற்றை இரண்டு கூற்றுக்களாக க குறிப்பிடு அதற்கும் மேலும், நாம் தகவல் ஒப்புக்கொள்ள முறைமைகளை வடிவமைத்து பின்கதவு மாற்றும் திருத்தத்தின் கூற்று பொருட்களை நீக்க முடியும். முயற்சிகள் பல தரவுத் தளங்களில் பொதுவான NER மாதிரியின் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை காட்டுகி', 'ur': 'نام لیا گیٹی شناسایی (NER) ایک بنیادی کام ہے کہ ایک دیے ہوئے جماعت سے مخصوص طریقوں کی شناسایی کرے۔ اس کے باعث جسم کی طرح ظاہر ہوتی ہے، یہ تین دفعہ میں تقسیم ہو سکتا ہے، یعنی فلت نیر، نیٹ نیر، اور قطع نیر. موجود درجے کے درمیان، صرف پیدا کرنے والی موڈل ان تین دفتروں کے ساتھ ایک طرح اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں. However, when the generative model applied to NER, its optimization objective is not consistent with the task, which makes the model vulnerable to the wrong biases. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے نسل پر غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط کرنے والی غلط غلط غلط غلط کرنے والی غلط غلط غلط غلط غلط کرنے والی غلط غلط غلط غ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم داخل اور داخل انٹیٹیسی ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزائن ڈیزا تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ میں جرانیٹ نیر موڈل کی عملکرد بہتر کر سکتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Nhận dạng thực thể có tên (NER) là nhiệm vụ cơ bản để nhận diện các kiểu thực thể cụ thể từ một câu. Tùy thuộc vào cách các thực thể xuất hiện trong câu, nó có thể được chia thành ba mặt phụ đề, cụ thể là, Flat, Nested NER, và Discotồn tại. Trong các phương pháp hiện tại, chỉ có mô hình gen có thể thích nghi đồng thời với ba mặt phụ đề này. Tuy nhiên, khi mô hình gây tác động được áp dụng cho cái máy, mục tiêu của nó không phù hợp với nhiệm vụ, mà làm cho mô hình này dễ bị giả. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta phân tích các sai sót trong quá trình sản xuất từ một quan điểm nhân quả và gán chúng cho hai điểm nhầm lẫn: báo cáo tương ứng trước ngữ cảnh lẫn quy trình thực thể. Chúng tôi thiết kế các phương pháp giải mã dữ liệu gia tăng bậc truyền để loại bỏ những mâu thuẩn trên trên theo lý thuyết điều chỉnh hậu môn. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể cải thiện hiệu quả của mô hình mang hệ gen trong các bộ dữ liệu khác nhau.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Mavjud usullarda faqat generativ modeli bu uchta vazifalarga bir qanday o'zgartira oladi. Lekin, generativ modeli NER dasturiga qoʻllanganda, uning optimiz obʼekti vazifa bilan birinchi narsa emas, bu modelni notoʻgʻri vazifalarga qo'llanmagan. Bu qogʻozda, biz avval jarayonining notoʻgʻri harakatlarni faqat tarjima qilamiz va ularni ikkita qismlarga qo'shib kelamiz: pre-context hoosida va tizim tartib beradi. Ko'rsatganda, biz bir narsa va Inter-entity haqida maʼlumotni tasdiqlash usullarini yaratish uchun yuqori tuzuvlarni o'chirish tugmasini yaratish. Tajribalar turli maʼlumotlar sahifadagi generativ NER modelini bajarish imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi.", 'da': 'Navngivet enhedsgenkendelse (NER) er en grundlæggende opgave at genkende bestemte typer enheder fra en given sætning. Afhængigt af hvordan enhederne vises i sætningen, kan den opdeles i tre underopgaver, nemlig Flat NER, Nested NER og Discontinuous NER. Blandt de eksisterende metoder kan kun den generative model tilpasses ensartet til disse tre underopgaver. Men når den generative model anvendes på NER, er dens optimeringsmål ikke i overensstemmelse med opgaven, hvilket gør modellen sårbar over for de forkerte fordomme. I denne artikel analyserer vi de forkerte fordomme i genereringsprocessen fra et kausalitetsperspektiv og tilskriver dem to forvirrende: pre-context confounder og entity-order confounder. Desuden designer vi Intra- og Inter-entity Deconfounding Data Augmentation metoder for at eliminere ovennævnte confounders ifølge teorien om bagdør justering. Eksperimenter viser, at vores metode kan forbedre ydeevnen af den generative NER model i forskellige datasæt.', 'bg': 'Признаването на наименовани субекти (НЕР) е основна задача за разпознаване на конкретни видове субекти от дадено изречение. В зависимост от това как същностите се появяват в изречението, тя може да бъде разделена на три подзадачи, а именно Плоска НЕР, Вгнесена НЕР и Прекъсваща НЕР. Сред съществуващите подходи, само генеративният модел може да бъде еднакво адаптиран към тези три подзадачи. Въпреки това, когато генеративният модел се прилага към НЕР, неговата оптимизационна цел не е в съответствие със задачата, което прави модела уязвим към неправилните отклонения. В настоящата статия анализираме неправилните отклонения в процеса на генериране от гледна точка на причинно-следствената връзка и ги приписваме на две объркващи фактори: предконтекстно объркващо устройство и объркващо устройство по реда на единиците. Освен това ние проектираме методи за увеличаване на данни за вътрешно и междусубектно деконфундиране, за да елиминираме горните объркващи фактори според теорията за корекция на задната врата. Експериментите показват, че нашият метод може да подобри производителността на генеративния модел в различни набори от данни.', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih subjekta (NER) je osnovni zadatak prepoznati specifične vrste subjekta iz određene rečenice. Zavisi o tome kako se entiteti pojavljuju u rečenici, može se podijeliti na tri podstava, a to je Flat NER, Nested NER i prekinuti NER. Među postojećim pristupima, samo generativni model može biti uniformno prilagođen ovim tri podstakla. Međutim, kad se generativni model primjenjuje na NER, njegov optimizacijski cilj nije u skladu s zadatkom, što čini model ranjivim na nepravilne predrasude. U ovom papiru analiziramo nepravde predrasude u procesu generacije iz perspektive uzrokovanja i pripisujemo ih dvojici zbunjenika: prekontekst zbunjenika i zbunjenika reda entiteta. Osim toga, mi dizajniramo metode povećanja podataka unutrašnjih i međusubjekta kako bi eliminirali iznad spojivača prema teoriji prilagodbe stražnjih vrata. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš metod može poboljšati učinkovitost generativnog modela NER-a u raznim podacima.', 'nl': 'Benamde entiteitsherkenning (NER) is een fundamentele taak om specifieke soorten entiteiten uit een bepaalde zin te herkennen. Afhankelijk van hoe de entiteiten in de zin verschijnen, kan het worden onderverdeeld in drie subtaken, namelijk Vlakke NER, Nested NER en Discontinuous NER. Van de bestaande benaderingen kan alleen het generatieve model uniform worden aangepast aan deze drie subtaken. Wanneer het generatieve model echter wordt toegepast op NER, is de optimalisatiedoelstelling niet consistent met de taak, waardoor het model kwetsbaar is voor de onjuiste biases. In dit artikel analyseren we de onjuiste biases in het generatieproces vanuit een causaliteitsperspectief en wijzen ze toe aan twee confounders: pre-context confounder en entity-order confounder. Verder ontwerpen we Intra- en Inter-entity Deconfinding Data Augmentation methodes om bovenstaande confounders te elimineren volgens de theorie van backdoor aanpassing. Experimenten tonen aan dat onze methode de prestaties van het generatieve NER model in verschillende datasets kan verbeteren.', 'de': 'Benannte Entitätenerkennung (NER) ist eine grundlegende Aufgabe, bestimmte Entitätentypen aus einem bestimmten Satz zu erkennen. Je nachdem, wie die Entitäten im Satz erscheinen, kann er in drei Teilaufgaben unterteilt werden, nämlich Flat NER, Nested NER und Discontinuous NER. Unter den bestehenden Ansätzen kann nur das generative Modell einheitlich an diese drei Teilaufgaben angepasst werden. Wenn das generative Modell jedoch auf NER angewendet wird, stimmt sein Optimierungsziel nicht mit der Aufgabe überein, was das Modell anfällig für falsche Verzerrungen macht. In diesem Beitrag analysieren wir die falschen Verzerrungen im Generierungsprozess aus kausaler Perspektive und ordnen sie zwei Konfoundern zu: dem Pre-Kontext-Confounder und dem Entity-Order-Confounder. Darüber hinaus entwerfen wir Intra- und Inter-Entity Deconfinding Data Augmentation Methoden, um die oben genannten Confounder gemäß der Theorie der Backdoor Anpassung zu eliminieren. Experimente zeigen, dass unsere Methode die Performance des generativen NER-Modells in verschiedenen Datensätzen verbessern kann.', 'id': 'Pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) adalah tugas dasar untuk mengenali jenis entitas spesifik dari kalimat tertentu. Tergantung bagaimana entitas muncul dalam kalimat, dapat dibagi menjadi tiga subtasks, yaitu, Flat NER, Nested NER, dan Discontinuous NER. Di antara pendekatan yang ada, hanya model generasi dapat disesuaikan secara seragam dengan tiga subtasks ini. Namun, ketika model generatif diterapkan untuk NER, tujuan optimisasinya tidak konsisten dengan tugas, yang membuat model rentan terhadap biases yang salah. Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis bias yang salah dalam proses generasi dari sudut pandang penyebabnya dan atribut mereka kepada dua penyebab kekacauan: pre-konteks kekacauan dan entity-order kekacauan. Selain itu, kami merancang metode Pendekonfounding Data Augmentation Intra- dan Inter-entity untuk menghilangkan kekacauan di atas menurut teori penyesuaian pintu belakang. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita dapat meningkatkan prestasi model NER generatif dalam berbagai set data.', 'fa': 'شناسایی entity نامیده شده (NER) یک وظیفه بنیادی برای شناسایی از نوع entities خاص از یک جمله نامیده است. بستگی به چگونه شرکت\u200cها در جمله ظاهر می\u200cشوند، می\u200cتواند به سه پایگاه تقسیم شود، یعنی: Flat NER، Nested NER و پایین NER. بین بررسی\u200cهای موجود، تنها مدل ژنرائیت می\u200cتواند با این سه بررسی\u200cها متفاوت شود. با این حال، هنگامی که مدل ژنترافی به NER کاربرد می شود، هدف optimization آن با وظیفه موجود نیست، که مدل را به صورت اشتباهی آسیب می دهد. در این کاغذ، ما فرضیه های اشتباهی در فرایند نسل را از یک دیدگاه باعث دلایل تحلیل می کنیم و آنها را به دو تنگ کننده تحلیل می کنیم: پیش از محیط متجاوز و متجاوز دستور entities. علاوه بر این، ما روش\u200cهای افزایش داده\u200cهای داخلی و داخلی را طراحی می\u200cکنیم تا روش\u200cهای افزایش داده\u200cها را از بین ببریم که افزایش\u200cکننده\u200cهای بالا بر طبق نظریه اصلاح در پشتیبانی است. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما می\u200cتواند عملکرد مدل NER ژنراتیک را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مختلف بهبود دهد.', 'sw': 'Kutambua entity jina (NER) ni kazi ya msingi ya kutambua aina maalum za vitu kutoka hukumu fulani. Kutegemea jinsi vitu vinavyoonekana kwenye hukumu hiyo, inaweza kugawanywa katika majukumu matatu, yaani UKIMWI, UKIMWI, na UKIMWI wa Kuendelea. Miongoni mwa mbinu zilizopo, mtindo wa kizalendo pekee unaweza kubadilishwa na kazi hizi tatu. Hata hivyo, pale muundo wa jeneral unavyotumiwa kwa NER, lengo lake la kuboresha halijakamilika na kazi hiyo, ambalo linafanya muundo huo hatarishi kwa upendeleo usio sahihi. In this paper, we analyze the incorrect biases in the generation process from a causality perspective and attribute them to two confounders: pre-context confounder and entity-order confounder.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunaunda mbinu za kuanzisha data za upatikanaji wa Intaneti na Intaneti kwa mujibu wa nadharia ya kuboresha nje ya nyuma. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kuboresha ufanisi wa muundo wa jenerali wa NER katika seti mbalimbali za data.', 'ko': '명명된 엔티티 인식(NER)은 주어진 문장에서 특정 유형의 엔티티를 식별하는 기본 작업입니다.문장에 엔티티가 나타나는 방식에 따라 평면 NER, 중첩 NER, 불연속 NER 등 세 개의 하위 임무로 나눌 수 있습니다.기존의 방법에서 생성 모델만 이 세 가지 하위 임무에 통일적으로 적응할 수 있다.그러나 생성 모델이 NER에 적용될 때 최적화 목표가 작업과 일치하지 않기 때문에 이 모델은 오류 편차의 영향을 받기 쉽다.본고에서 우리는 인과관계의 측면에서 생성 과정에서의 잘못된 편견을 분석하고 이를 두 가지 혼합 요소인 전어경 혼합과 실체 순서 혼합으로 돌렸다.그 밖에 우리는 뒷문 조정 이론에 따라 실체 내와 실체 간의 데이터 강화 방법을 설계하여 상술한 혼합 요소를 제거했다.실험에 따르면 우리의 방법은 생성성 NER 모델의 각종 데이터 집합에서의 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다.', 'tr': "Adlanylan faýllary tanamak (NER) berilen sözlerden belli hillerni tanamak üçin esasy zaddyr. Sözlemde bir zatlar nädip görünýändigine görä, ol üç süýtgeşik bilen bölünebilir, iň. Flat NER, Nested NER we kesişikli NER. Öň bar ýakynlaryň arasynda diňe jeneratçy modeli bu üç asttalara uniformly üýtgedilebilir. Ýöne, generasiýa nusga NER'e uygulanan bolsa, onuň optimizasiýa maksady buýruk bilen däldir. Bu nusga ýalňyş tertibine hasaplanyr. Bu kagyzda, biz jenaýatyň dogry nepisliklerini sebäbi perspektivden çykýar we olaryny iki çarpyşçylara tanyşdyrýarys: öňki kontekst çarpyşçylar we guralýar. Munuň üçin, üstündeki kargalaryny pozmak üçin Intra-we Inter-entitet şeklini tasarlaýar. Testler biziň metodamyzyň döredijili NER nusgasyny üýtgedijiligini görkezýär.", 'af': "Genaamde entiteit herken (NER) is 'n fundamentele taak om spesifieke tipes entiteite van 'n gegewe seting te herken. Afhanklik van hoe die entiteite in die seting verskyn, kan dit in drie subtaske gedeel word, dit is: Flat NER, Nested NER en Afsluit NER. onder die bestaande toegang kan slegs die genereerbare model eenvoudig aan hierdie drie ondersteuning aanpas word. Maar wanneer die genereerbare model aan NER aangepas word, is sy optimalisasie doel nie ooreenkomstig met die taak nie, wat maak die model vulnerabele aan die verkeerde voorspoedies. In hierdie papier, ons analyseer die verkeerde biases in die generasie proses van 'n oorsaaklikheid perspektief en attributeer hulle na twee skandeerders: voor-konteks skandeerder en entiteitorde skandeerder. Verder, ons ontwerp binne- en Inter- entiteit Onbekonfondering Data Augmentasie metodes om die bo-verbondigers te elimineer volgens die teoriee van agterdeur aanpassing. Eksperimente wys dat ons metode die prestasie van die genereerbare NER model in verskillende datastelle kan verbeter.", 'sq': 'Njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER) është një detyrë thelbësore për të njohur lloje specifike të njësive nga një fjalim i caktuar. Në varësi se si njësitë shfaqen në dënim, ajo mund të ndahet në tre nënpyetje, veçanërisht, Flat NER, Nested NER dhe Discontinuous NER. Midis qasjeve ekzistuese, vetëm modeli gjenerativ mund të përshtatet uniformisht ndaj këtyre tre nënpyetjeve. Megjithatë, kur modeli gjenerativ zbatohet në NER, objektivi i tij optimizues nuk është konsistent me detyrën, e cila e bën modelin të prekshëm ndaj paragjykimeve të gabuara. Në këtë letër, ne analizojmë paragjykimet e gabuara në procesin e gjeneratës nga një perspektivë kauzaliteti dhe i atribuojmë a to dy përzjerësve: përzjerëse para-konteksti dhe përzjerëse njësi-rendi. Përveç kësaj, ne dizajnojmë metodat e zhdukjes së të dhënave të brendshme dhe ndër-njësive për të eleminuar ngatërrestarët e lartë sipas teorisë së rregullimit të derës mbrapa. Eksperimentet tregojnë se metoda jonë mund të përmirësojë performancën e modelit gjenerativ NER në grupe të dhënash të ndryshme.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ አካባቢዎቹ እንዴት እንደሚታዩ በተለያዩ ጊዜ፣ ጥሩ NER፣ NER እና የማይታወቀው NER በሚል በሦስት ደብዳቤዎች ይለያያሉ፡፡ በአሁኑ ደረጃዎች ውስጥ፣ የዘረኝነት ሞዴል ብቻ እነዚህን ሦስት ደብዳቤዎች በመቀላቀል ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን የዘረኝነት ሞዴል ወደ NER በተደረገ ጊዜ፣ ምርጫው አካባቢው ከስራ ጋር አይተካከልም፤ ምሳሌዎቹን ወደ ስህተት ጉዳይ ይታሰራል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የስሕተት ሁኔታ የፍጥረት ጉዳይ ከሙሉ እናሳያልን እናደርጋቸዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የውይይት አካባቢ አካባቢ ማሳየት ዳታ አቀማመጥ ማድረጊያውን ለማጥፋት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች ልዩ ዳታተሮች ውስጥ የዘረኝነታችንን አዲስ ሞዴል ማድረግ እንዲችሉ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նվանված անհատականության ճանաչելը (ՆԵՌ) հիմնարար խնդիր է որոշ տեսակի անհատականությունների ճանաչելը որոշ նախադասություններից: Հաշվի առնելով նախադասության մեջ ներկայացվող առանձնահատկություններից, այն կարող է բաժանել երեք ենթահարցերով, հատկապես՝ Flat NOR, nested NOR և Discon NOR: Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումների շրջանում միայն սերունդային մոդելը կարող է միանգամայն հարմարվել այս երեք ենթահարցերին: Այնուամենայնիվ, երբ սերունդային մոդելը կիրառվում է ՆԵՌ-ի վրա, դրա օպտիմացման նպատակը համապատասխան չէ խնդրի հետ, ինչը մոդելը խոցելի է դարձնում սխալ կողմնականությունների դեպքում: In this paper, we analyze the incorrect biases in the generation process from a causality perspective and attribute them to two confounders: pre-context confounder and entity-order confounder.  Ավելին, մենք նախագծում ենք ինտերա- և ինտերա-կազմակերպությունների բացահայտելու տվյալների աճման մեթոդներ, որպեսզի վերացնենք վերևում գտնվող խառնաշփոթները, ըստ ետևի դռան հարմարեցման տեսության: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը կարող է բարելավել սերունդային ՆԵՌ մոդելի արդյունքը տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերում:', 'az': 'Adlı entitə tanıması (NER) müəyyən edilmiş cümlədən müəyyən növlərin tanıması üçün əsas bir işdir. Sözümdə növbətlər necə göründüyünü bağlı olaraq, bu, Flat NER, Nested NER və Discontinuation NER-ə bölünə bilər. Mevcut tərəflərin arasında, yalnız generativ modeli bu üç dəstəklərə eyni olaraq uyğunlaşdırıla bilər. Ancaq, generativ modeli NER üçün istifadə edildikdə, onun optimizasiya məqsədi işlərə uyğun deyildir, bu modeli yanlış təsirlərə zəif edir. Bu kağızda, nəsil prosesində yanlış tərzlərini causality perspektivindən analiz edirik və onları iki karıştırıcı tərzlərinə təsdiqləyirik: əvvəlki kontekst karıştırıcı və entity-order karıştırıcı. Daha əlavə, biz intern-və Inter-entity-i təsdiqləyici Data Augmentation metodlarını təyin edirik ki, yuxarıdaki qarıştırıcıları arka qapı düzəltməsinin teoriyasına görə silmək üçün. Həqiqətən, təcrübələrimiz təcrübələrimiz müxtəlif verilən qurğularda generativ NER model in in performansını yaxşılaşdırabilir.', 'bn': 'নামের বস্তু স্বীকার (NER) একটি নির্দিষ্ট বাক্য থেকে নির্দিষ্ট ধরনের বস্তুকে চিনতে একটি মৌলিক কাজ। এই বাক্যে বস্তুগুলো কিভাবে দেখা যাচ্ছে তা নির্ভর করে এটি তিনটি সাবটাকাজে বিভক্ত হতে পারে, যার মধ্যে ফ্ল্যাট নেরার, নেস্টেড নের বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতির মধ্যে, শুধুমাত্র জেনারেটিভ মডেল এই তিনটি সাবটাকাজের সাথে একত্রিত হতে পারে। তবে যখন জেনারেটিভ মডেলটি NER-এ প্রয়োগ করা হয়, তার অপ্রায়শনশীল উদ্দেশ্য কাজের সাথে একত্রিত নয়, যার ফলে মডেল ভুল বৈষম্যের প্রতি ক্ষতিগ্রস এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়ার ভুল বিভ্রান্তির বিশ্লেষণ করি কারণের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে এবং তাদের দুটি বিভ্রান্তিতে বিশ্লেষণ এছাড়াও, আমরা ইন্ট্রা এবং ইন্টারনেটিটি ডিজাইন করি ডেটা অ্যাগমেন্টিং পদ্ধতিগুলোকে পেছনের দরজা সংশোধনের তত্ত্ব অনুযায়ী মুছে ফেলতে পারি। পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেটে জেনারেটিভ নেরিয়ার মডেলের প্রভাব বৃদ্ধি করতে', 'ca': "El reconeixement de l'entitat anomenada (NER) és una tasca fonamental de reconeixer tipus específics d'entitats d'una frase dada. Depenent de com apareixen les entitats en la frase, es poden dividir en tres subpreguntes, a saber, Flat NER, Nested NER i Discontinuous NER. Entre els enfocaments existents, només el model generador es pot adaptar uniformement a aquestes tres subtaskes. No obstant això, quan el model generador s'aplica a NER, el seu objectiu d'optimització no és coherent amb la tasca, que fa el model vulnerable a les tendències incorrectes. En aquest paper, analitzem els prejudicis incorrects en el procés de generació d'una perspectiva de causalitat i els atribuem a dos confondents: confondent pre-context i confondent entre entitats i ordres. A més, dissenyem mètodes d'augmentació de dades desconfondents entre i entre entitats per eliminar els desconfondents d'abans segons la teoria de l'ajustament de la porta posterior. Experiments show that our method can improve the performance of the generative NER model in various datasets.", 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER) je základním úkolem rozpoznávat konkrétní typy entit z dané věty. V závislosti na tom, jak entity vypadají ve větě, lze ji rozdělit do tří dílčích úkolů, jmenovitě plochý NER, vnořený NER a diskontinuální NER. Mezi existujícími přístupy lze jednotně přizpůsobit pouze generativní model těmto třem dílčím úkolům. Nicméně, pokud je generativní model aplikován na NER, jeho optimalizační cíl není v souladu s úkolem, což činí model zranitelný vůči nesprávným zaujatostem. V tomto článku analyzujeme nesprávné předsudky v procesu generování z perspektivy kauzality a přiřazujeme je dvěma konfounderům: předkontextovému konfounderu a entity-order confounderu. Dále navrhujeme metody rozšíření dat intra- a inter-entity pro eliminaci výše uvedených konfounderů podle teorie úpravy backdoor. Experimenty ukazují, že naše metoda může zlepšit výkon generativního NER modelu v různých datových sadách.', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) je osnovni zadatak prepoznati specifične vrste entiteta iz određene rečenice. Zavisi o tome kako se entiteti pojavljuju u rečenici, može se podijeliti na tri podataka, a to je Flat NER, Nested NER i prekinuti NER. Među postojećim pristupima, samo generativni model može biti uniformno prilagođen ovim tri podmetaka. Međutim, kad se generativni model primjenjuje na NER, njegov optimizacijski cilj nije u skladu s zadatkom, što čini model ranjivim na nepravde predrasude. U ovom papiru analiziramo nepravde predrasude u procesu generacije iz perspektive uzrokovanja i pripisujemo ih dvojici zbunjenika: prekontekst zbunjenika i zbunjenika reda entiteta. Osim toga, mi dizajniramo metode povećanja podataka unutrašnjih i međusubjekta kako bi eliminisali iznad spojivača prema teoriji prilagodbe stražnjih vrata. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naša metoda može poboljšati učinkovitost generativnog modela NER u različitim podacima.', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tunnustamine (NER) on põhiülesanne tunnustada konkreetset tüüpi üksusi antud lausest. Sõltuvalt sellest, kuidas üksused lauses ilmuvad, saab selle jagada kolmeks alamülesandeks, nimelt Flat NER, Nested NER ja Discontinuous NER. Olemasolevate lähenemisviiside hulgas saab nende kolme alamülesandega ühtlaselt kohandada ainult generatiivset mudelit. Kui aga NER-ile rakendatakse generatiivset mudelit, ei ole selle optimeerimise eesmärk ülesandega kooskõlas, mis muudab mudeli ebaõigete kallakute suhtes haavatavaks. Käesolevas töös analüüsime genereerimisprotsessi ebaõigeid kallakusi põhjusliku seose vaatenurgast ja omistame need kahele segajale: kontekstieelsele segajale ja olemusjärgu segajale. Lisaks töötame välja üksuste sisesed ja üksuste vahelised dekonfusing andmete suurendamise meetodid, et kõrvaldada eespool nimetatud segajad vastavalt tagaukse korrigeerimise teooriale. Katsed näitavad, et meie meetod võib parandada generatiivse NER mudeli jõudlust erinevates andmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen entiteettien tunnustaminen (NER) on keskeinen tehtävä tunnistaa tietyntyyppiset entiteetit tietystä lauseesta. Riippuen siitä, miten entiteetit näkyvät lauseessa, se voidaan jakaa kolmeen alatehtävään, nimittäin Flat NER, Nested NER ja Discontinuous NER. Nykyisistä lähestymistavoista vain generatiivinen malli voidaan mukauttaa yhdenmukaisesti näihin kolmeen alatehtävään. Kun NER:ään sovelletaan generatiivista mallia, sen optimointitavoite ei kuitenkaan ole tehtävän mukainen, mikä tekee mallista haavoittuvan väärille harhaille. Tässä työssä analysoimme vääriä vääristymiä syntyprosessissa kausaalisuuden näkökulmasta ja määritämme ne kahteen sekoittimeen: kontekstia edeltävään sekoittimeen ja entiteettijärjestyksen sekoittimeen. Lisäksi suunnittelemme Intra- ja Inter-entity Deconfounding Data Augmentation -menetelmiä poistamaan edellä mainitut sekoittajat backdoor-korjauksen teorian mukaisesti. Kokeet osoittavat, että menetelmämme voi parantaa generatiivisen NER-mallin suorituskykyä eri aineistoissa.', 'ha': "Sunan sunan sunan shaidar abun (NER) shi ne wani aikin muhimmi zuwa gane nau'in abun da aka ƙayyade daga cewa. Ana ƙayyade yadda abubuwa ke duka cikin maganar, za'a raba shi cikin taskõkin uku, kamar Shirin RUM, da KULLUM da wanda ba'a sãɓa ba. Babu daga hanyõyin da ke kai yanzu, za'a iya daidaita motsi kawai zuwa wannan mistakardu uku. A lokacin da za'a amfani da motsi na ɗabi'a zuwa NER, abunsa bai sami da aikin, kuma yana sanya motel mai haske zuwa tabar da ba mai maras inganci. Ga wannan takardan, Munã anayya masu inganci a cikin jarrabar kizabanta daga wani ma'anar matsayi na halarce su zuwa biyu mugunyar: pre-context composited below da kuma tsarin-mazaɓa da. Furthermore, we design Intra- and Inter-entity Deconfounding Data Augmentation methods to eliminate the above confounders according to the theory of backdoor adjustment.  Tajarakin na nuna cewa metodenmu yana iya ƙara mafarin misalin motel na NER cikin tsari daban-dane.", 'he': 'זיהוי יחידה בשם (NER) הוא משימה בסיסית לזהות סוגים ספציפיים של יחידות משפט מסוים. תלוי איך היחידות מופיעות במשפט, הן יכולות להיחלק לשלושה תת-שאלות, כלומר, flat NER, Nested NER, and Discontinuous NER. בין הגישות הקיומות, רק דוגמנית הדור יכולה להתאים באופן היחיד לשלושת השאלות הללו. בכל אופן, כאשר הדוגמאל הדורתי משמש על NER, מטרתו של אופטימיזציה אינה תואמת למשימה, מה שעושה את הדוגמאל פגיע למחיות הלא נכונות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מנתחים את ההתמונות הלא נכונות בתהליך הדור מנקודת מבט סיבוליות ומאפשרים אותם לשני מבלבלים: מבלבל לפני הקונקסט ומתבלבל סדר היחידות. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מעצבים שיטות גידול נתונים בתוך-ובין-יחידות כדי להפיל את המבולבלים העליונים לפי תיאוריה של התאמת הדלת האחורית. ניסויים מראים שהשיטה שלנו יכולה לשפר את ההפעלה של דוגמנית NER הדורתית במערכת נתונים שונות.', 'jv': 'name Mawih-wih saben piye entekake kapan kanggo sabanjuré an sabanjuré, iso ketemukno karo telu basa, nambah, Plat NeR, Nest NeR, lan Diskntinuuus NeR. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepul iki, kita ranjelisar bias sing ora dadi ning perusahaan kelangan kelangan karo perusahaan kelangan budhakan bakal dumadhakan iki: nggawe langgar sampek karo perusahaan karo perusahaan bakal dumadhakan pangan. Label Perintah barêng-barêng kuwi ngéwangé sampeyan akeh iso ngéwé njaluk modèl NeR sing ngewehke nggawe dataset', 'sk': 'Priznavanje imenovanih subjektov (NER) je temeljna naloga priznavanja določenih vrst subjektov iz danega stavka. Odvisno od tega, kako se entitete pojavijo v stavku, ga lahko razdelimo na tri podnaloge, in sicer Flat NER, Nested NER in Discontinuous NER. Med obstoječimi pristopi se lahko samo generativni model enotno prilagodi tem trem podnalogam. Vendar, ko se generativni model uporablja za NER, njegov cilj optimizacije ni skladen z nalogo, zaradi česar je model občutljiv na napačne pristranskosti. V prispevku analiziramo nepravilne pristranskosti v procesu generiranja z vidika vzročnosti in jih pripisujemo dvema zmedenikoma: predkontekstnim zmedenikom in entitetnim vrstnim zmedenikom. Poleg tega oblikujemo metode povečanja podatkov za razširjanje podatkov znotraj in medentitet, da bi odpravili zgoraj navedene zmešalnike v skladu s teorijo prilagoditve zadnjih vrat. Eksperimenti kažejo, da lahko naša metoda izboljša učinkovitost generativnega NER modela v različnih naborih podatkov.', 'bo': 'མིང་བཏགས་པའི་དབུལ་གྱི་རྟོགས་ཤེས་ནུས་(NER)ནི་ཚིག་རྩ་བའི་བྱ་རིམ་ཞིག་རེད། depending on how the entities appear in the sentence, it can be divided into three subtasks, namely, Flat NER, Nested NER, and Discontinuous NER. གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་འདྲ་བར་བྱུང་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་རྩིས་བ་འདི་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཐུབ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ཇི་ནོར་བསྐྱེད་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་NER་ལ་སྤྱོད་པ་དང་དེའི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆོས་མཐུན་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལས འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གནད་དོན་དག་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་དུ་ཡོད། Furthermore, we design Intra- and Inter-entity Deconfounding Data Augmentation methods to eliminate the above confounders according to the theory of backdoor adjustment. Experiments show that our method can improve the performance of the NER model in various datasets.'}
{'en': 'Inducing Positive Perspectives with Text Reframing', 'es': 'Un enfoque de la teoría de la información para la ingeniería rápida sin etiquetas de verdad sobre el terreno', 'ar': 'نهج معلوماتي نظري للهندسة السريعة بدون تسميات الحقيقة الأرضية', 'fr': "Une approche basée sur la théorie de l'information pour accélérer l'ingénierie sans étiquettes de vérité de terrain", 'pt': 'Uma abordagem da teoria da informação para a engenharia imediata sem rótulos de verdade do solo', 'zh': '一种无地实,一种无地实', 'hi': 'ग्राउंड ट्रुथ लेबल के बिना इंजीनियरिंग को प्रॉम्प्ट करने के लिए एक सूचना-सैद्धांतिक दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Информационно-теоретический подход к подсказке проектирования без меток наземной правды', 'ja': '真実のラベルなしでエンジニアリングを促進するための情報理論的アプローチ', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Teoiriciúil Faisnéise maidir le hInnealtóireacht Phras Gan Lipéid Fhírinne Talún', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια θεωρητική προσέγγιση της πληροφορίας για την ταχεία μηχανική χωρίς ετικέτες επίγειας αλήθειας', 'hu': 'Információelméleti megközelítés a gyors tervezéshez földi igazság címkék nélkül', 'it': "Un approccio teorico dell'informazione all'ingegneria rapida senza etichette di verità di terra", 'kk': 'Мәлімет теоретикалық инженерлік жарлықтары жоқ сұрау үшін', 'lt': 'Informacinis ir teorinis metodas skatinti inžineriją be antžeminės tiesos ženklų', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'An Information-theoretic Approach to Prompt Engineering Without Ground Truth Labels', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Approċċ Informattiv-teoretiku għall-Inġinerija Promotiva mingħajr Tikketti tal-Verità tal-Art', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл-теоретик Инженерчлэлийг Газрын Үнэндээ Хариулагүйгээр дэмжих', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Podejście informacyjno-teoretyczne do szybkiej inżynierii bez etykiet gruntowych prawd', 'ro': 'O abordare teoretică informațională a ingineriei prompte fără etichete de adevăr la sol', 'sr': 'Informativni teorijski pristup podstaženju inženjerstva bez oznake istine', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaad-theoretical Approach to Prompt Engineering Without Ground Truth Labels', 'sv': 'Ett informationsteoretiskt förhållningssätt till snabb teknik utan marksanningsmärkningar', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'بنیادی حقیقت لابل کے بغیر انجنیری پیغام کرنے کے لئے ایک معلومات-نظریہ تقریبا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp định lý thông tin để tân tiến phòng máy mà không có hiệu quả thực.', 'bg': 'Информационно-теоретичен подход към бързото инженерство без етикети за истината', 'nl': 'Een informatietheoretische benadering van snelle engineering zonder grondwaarheidslabels', 'hr': 'Informativni teorijski pristup potaknuti inženjerstvo bez oznake istine podzemne', 'da': 'En informationsteoretisk tilgang til hurtig teknik uden jordsandhedsmærker', 'id': 'Sebuah Pendekatan Informasi-Teoretik untuk Prompt Engineering Tanpa Label Kebenaran Bumi', 'de': 'Ein informationstheoretischer Ansatz für schnelles Engineering ohne Ground Truth Labels', 'ko': '지면 진가 라벨이 필요 없는 정보론의 빠른 공정 방법', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa taarifa unaoendelea Kujaribu Uhandisi bila Taarifa za Ukweli', 'tr': 'Ingeniýeriýany ýeri Gerçek Etiketleri bolmasak üçin maglumat-teoriýasy ýazmak', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një qasje informacioni-teorike për të nxitur inxhinierinë pa etiketa të vërtetës tokësore', 'am': 'የመሬት እውነተኛ ምልክቶች ሳይኖር የኢንጂንጂንጂንጂልን ለማቀናኘት የመረጃ-theoretic', 'az': 'Üstündə haqq etiketləri olmadan Mühəndir təşkil etmək üçün məlumat-teoriki Yaxınlıq', 'bn': 'গ্রাউন্ডের সত্য লেবেল ছাড়াই ইঞ্জিনিয়ার প্রস্তুতি প্রদান করার জন্য তথ্য-ততিত্ব', 'hy': 'Տեղեկատվական-տեսական մոտեցում ճարտարագիտությունը առանց հողի ճշմարտության պիտակների խրախուսելու համար', 'bs': 'Informativni teorijski pristup podstaženju inženjerstva bez oznake istine podzemne', 'ca': "Un enfocament teòric d'informació per promoure l'enginyeria sense etiquetes de veritat fonamental", 'cs': 'Informačně-teoretický přístup k rychlému inženýrství bez označení základní pravdy', 'fa': 'یک نزدیک اطلاعات-نظریه برای پیشنهاد مهندسی بدون نشانه\u200cهای حقیقت زمینی', 'et': 'Infoteoreetiline lähenemine kiirele insenerile ilma maapealse tõe märgisteta', 'fi': 'Tietoteoreettinen lähestymistapa nopeaan suunnitteluun ilman totuusmerkkejä', 'he': 'גישה מידע-תיאורטית כדי להזעיק הנדסה ללא תוויות אמת אדמה', 'sk': 'Informacijsko-teoretični pristop k hitremu inženiringu brez oznak o zemeljski resnici', 'jv': 'Nambah Informasi-theoretik Tulung Ketokake kanggo Wehhusani Inginingêr nang Label sing katêpakan Jaringan', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྨང་གཞིའི་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་གི་ཉེན་སྐོར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Sentiment transfer is one popular example of a text style transfer task where the goal is to reverse the sentiment polarity of a text With a sentiment reversal comes also a reversal in meaning We introduce a different but related task called positive reframing in which we neutralize a negative point of view and generate a more positive perspective for the author without contradicting the original meaning Our insistence on meaning preservation makes positive reframing a challenging and semantically rich task To facilitate rapid progress we introduce a large scale benchmark Positive Psychology Frames with 8,349 sentence pairs and 12,755 structured annotations to explain positive reframing in terms of six theoretically motivated reframing strategies Then we evaluate a set of state of the art text style transfer models and conclude by discussing key challenges and directions for future work', 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados obtienen un conocimiento lingüístico y fáctico sustancial de los cuerpos masivos en los que se capacitan, y la ingeniería rápida busca alinear estos modelos con tareas específicas. Desafortunadamente, los métodos de ingeniería rápida existentes requieren cantidades significativas de datos etiquetados, acceso a los parámetros del modelo o ambos. Presentamos un nuevo método para seleccionar plantillas de solicitud\\ textit {sin ejemplos etiquetados} y\\ textit {sin acceso directo al modelo}. Específicamente, sobre un conjunto de plantillas candidatas, elegimos la plantilla que maximiza la información mutua entre la entrada y la salida del modelo correspondiente. A través de 8 conjuntos de datos que representan 7 tareas distintas de PNL, mostramos que cuando una plantilla tiene una alta información mutua, también tiene una alta precisión en la tarea. En el modelo más grande, la selección de indicaciones con nuestro método obtiene el 90\\% del camino desde la precisión promedio de las solicitudes hasta la mejor precisión de las solicitudes y no requiere etiquetas de verdad sobre el terreno.', 'ar': 'تستمد النماذج اللغوية المدربة مسبقًا المعرفة الواقعية واللغوية الكبيرة من المجموعات الضخمة التي تم تدريبهم عليها ، وتسعى الهندسة السريعة إلى مواءمة هذه النماذج مع مهام محددة. لسوء الحظ ، تتطلب أساليب الهندسة السريعة الحالية كميات كبيرة من البيانات المصنفة أو الوصول إلى معلمات النموذج أو كليهما. نقدم طريقة جديدة لاختيار قوالب المطالبة \\ textit {بدون الأمثلة المعنونة} و \\ textit {دون الوصول المباشر إلى النموذج}. على وجه التحديد ، من خلال مجموعة من القوالب المرشحة ، نختار القالب الذي يزيد المعلومات المتبادلة بين المدخلات ومخرجات النموذج المقابل. من خلال 8 مجموعات بيانات تمثل 7 مهام متميزة في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، نوضح أنه عندما يكون للقالب معلومات متبادلة عالية ، فإنه يتمتع أيضًا بدقة عالية في المهمة. في النموذج الأكبر ، يؤدي اختيار المطالبات باستخدام طريقتنا إلى الحصول على 90 \\٪ من الطريق من متوسط الدقة السريعة إلى أفضل دقة سريعة ولا يتطلب أي ملصقات للحقيقة الأساسية.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques préformés tirent des connaissances linguistiques et factuelles substantielles des corpus massifs sur lesquels ils sont formés, et l'ingénierie rapide cherche à aligner ces modèles sur des tâches spécifiques. Malheureusement, les méthodes d'ingénierie rapides existantes nécessitent des quantités importantes de données étiquetées, l'accès aux paramètres du modèle, ou les deux. Nous introduisons une nouvelle méthode pour sélectionner les modèles d'invite\xa0\\ textit {sans exemples étiquetés} et\xa0\\ textit {sans accès direct au modèle}. Plus précisément, parmi un ensemble de modèles candidats, nous choisissons le modèle qui maximise les informations mutuelles entre l'entrée et la sortie du modèle correspondant. À travers 8 ensembles de données représentant 7 tâches de PNL distinctes, nous montrons que lorsqu'un modèle contient des informations mutuelles élevées, il présente également une grande précision sur la tâche. Sur le modèle le plus grand, la sélection d'invites avec notre méthode permet d'obtenir 90\xa0\\\xa0% du chemin entre la précision moyenne des invites et la meilleure précision d'invite et ne nécessite aucune étiquette de vérité de terrain.", 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados derivam conhecimento linguístico e factual substancial dos massivos corpora nos quais são treinados, e a engenharia rápida procura alinhar esses modelos a tarefas específicas. Infelizmente, os métodos de engenharia imediata existentes exigem quantidades significativas de dados rotulados, acesso aos parâmetros do modelo ou ambos. Introduzimos um novo método para selecionar modelos de prompt \\textit{sem exemplos rotulados} e \\textit{sem acesso direto ao modelo}. Especificamente, sobre um conjunto de modelos candidatos, escolhemos o modelo que maximiza a informação mútua entre a entrada e a saída do modelo correspondente. Em 8 conjuntos de dados representando 7 tarefas distintas de PNL, mostramos que quando um modelo tem alta informação mútua, ele também tem alta precisão na tarefa. No modelo maior, selecionar prompts com nosso método obtém 90\\% do caminho desde a precisão média do prompt até a melhor precisão do prompt e não requer rótulos de verdade.', 'zh': '先训者语模其大语料库,多得语言事实,及时功试,与特定同务。 所恨者,今快速工程法须大标数及/模参数访问。 引入一模板 \\textit{示例} 、 \\textit{不访模} 之法。 具体来说,候选模板上,择最大化输与相应者模板。 7异务NLP8数集,吾言模板有高互信息,其在任也高准确性。 凡模形之大者,用吾法择言可得平均至至 90\\%,不须实表。', 'ja': '事前に訓練された言語モデルは、訓練された大規模なコーパスから実質的な言語学的および事実的知識を導き出し、プロンプトエンジニアリングはこれらのモデルを特定のタスクに合わせようとします。残念ながら、既存のプロンプトエンジニアリング方法には、大量のラベル付けされたデータ、モデルパラメータへのアクセス、またはその両方が必要です。プロンプトテンプレート\\ textit {ラベル付けされた例なし}と\\ textit {モデルへの直接アクセスなし}を選択するための新しい方法を紹介します。具体的には、一連の候補テンプレートの中から、入力と対応するモデル出力との間の相互情報を最大化するテンプレートを選択します。7つの異なるNLPタスクを表す8つのデータセットでは、テンプレートが高い相互情報を持つ場合、タスクの精度も高いことが示されています。最大のモデルでは、メソッドを使用してプロンプトを選択すると、平均プロンプト精度から最適プロンプト精度までの90 \\%が得られ、グラウンドトゥルースラベルは必要ありません。', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल बड़े पैमाने पर कॉर्पोरेट से पर्याप्त भाषाई और तथ्यात्मक ज्ञान प्राप्त करते हैं, जिस पर उन्हें प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, और त्वरित इंजीनियरिंग इन मॉडलों को विशिष्ट कार्यों के लिए संरेखित करना चाहती है। दुर्भाग्य से, मौजूदा प्रॉम्प्ट इंजीनियरिंग विधियों को लेबल किए गए डेटा की महत्वपूर्ण मात्रा, मॉडल पैरामीटर तक पहुंच, या दोनों की आवश्यकता होती है। हम प्रॉम्प्ट टेम्पलेट्स \\textit{लेबल किए गए उदाहरणों के बिना} और \\textit{मॉडल तक सीधी पहुँच के बिना} का चयन करने के लिए एक नई विधि पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, उम्मीदवार टेम्पलेट्स के एक सेट पर, हम टेम्पलेट चुनते हैं जो इनपुट और संबंधित मॉडल आउटपुट के बीच पारस्परिक जानकारी को अधिकतम करता है। 7 अलग-अलग एनएलपी कार्यों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाले 8 डेटासेट में, हम दिखाते हैं कि जब किसी टेम्पलेट में उच्च पारस्परिक जानकारी होती है, तो इसमें कार्य पर उच्च सटीकता भी होती है। सबसे बड़े मॉडल पर, हमारी विधि के साथ संकेतों का चयन करने से औसत प्रॉम्प्ट सटीकता से सर्वोत्तम प्रॉम्प्ट सटीकता तक 90% रास्ता मिलता है और इसके लिए कोई जमीनी सच्चाई लेबल की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है।', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные языковые модели получают существенные лингвистические и фактические знания из массивных корпусов, на которых они обучаются, и быстрое проектирование стремится привести эти модели в соответствие с конкретными задачами. К сожалению, существующие методы быстрого проектирования требуют значительных объемов маркированных данных, доступа к параметрам модели или и того, и другого. Мы вводим новый метод выбора шаблонов подсказок\\textit{без помеченных примеров} и \\textit{без прямого доступа к модели}. В частности, над набором шаблонов-кандидатов мы выбираем шаблон, который максимизирует взаимную информацию между входом и соответствующим выходом модели. В 8 наборах данных, представляющих 7 различных задач NLP, мы показываем, что когда шаблон имеет высокую взаимную информацию, он также имеет высокую точность при выполнении задачи. На самой крупной модели выбор подсказок с помощью нашего метода получает 90\\% от средней точности подсказки до лучшей точности подсказки и не требует ярлыков истины.', 'ga': 'Faigheann múnlaí teanga réamhoilte eolas substaintiúil teangeolaíoch agus fíorasach ón gcorpas ollmhór ar a gcuirtear oiliúint orthu, agus féachann innealtóireacht phras na múnlaí sin a ailíniú le tascanna sonracha. Ar an drochuair, éilíonn modhanna pras innealtóireachta atá ann cheana méideanna suntasacha sonraí lipéadaithe, rochtain ar pharaiméadair mhúnla, nó an dá cheann. Cuirimid modh nua isteach chun teimpléid leide \\textit{gan samplaí lipéadaithe} agus \\textit{gan rochtain dhíreach ar an tsamhail} a roghnú. Go sonrach, thar shraith teimpléid iarrthóra, roghnaimid an teimpléad a uasmhéadaíonn an fhaisnéis fhrithpháirteach idir an t-ionchur agus an t-aschur múnla comhfhreagrach. Ar fud 8 tacar sonraí a léiríonn 7 dtasc ar leith NLP, léirímid nuair a bhíonn faisnéis fhrithpháirteach ard ag teimpléad, go bhfuil ardchruinneas aige ar an tasc freisin. Ar an tsamhail is mó, nuair a roghnaítear leideanna lenár modh, gheobhaidh tú 90 \\% den bhealach ón meánchruinneas pras go dtí an cruinneas pras is fearr agus ní gá lipéid fhírinneachta ar bith.', 'el': 'Τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα αντλούν ουσιαστικές γλωσσικές και πραγματικές γνώσεις από τα τεράστια σώματα στα οποία εκπαιδεύονται, και η άμεση μηχανική επιδιώκει να ευθυγραμμίσει αυτά τα μοντέλα με συγκεκριμένα καθήκοντα. Δυστυχώς, οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι έγκαιρης μηχανικής απαιτούν σημαντικές ποσότητες επισημασμένων δεδομένων, πρόσβαση σε παραμέτρους μοντέλου, ή και τα δύο. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την επιλογή προτύπων προτάσεων \\textit{χωρίς επισημασμένα παραδείγματα} και \\textit{χωρίς άμεση πρόσβαση στο μοντέλο}. Συγκεκριμένα, πάνω από ένα σύνολο υποδειγμάτων υποψηφίων, επιλέγουμε το πρότυπο που μεγιστοποιεί τις αμοιβαίες πληροφορίες μεταξύ της εισόδου και της αντίστοιχης εξόδου μοντέλου. Στα 8 σύνολα δεδομένων που αντιπροσωπεύουν 7 διακριτές εργασίες δείχνουν ότι όταν ένα πρότυπο έχει υψηλές αμοιβαίες πληροφορίες, έχει επίσης υψηλή ακρίβεια στην εργασία. Στο μεγαλύτερο μοντέλο, η επιλογή προτάσεων με τη μέθοδο μας παίρνει 90\\% του τρόπου από τη μέση ακρίβεια προτροπής στην καλύτερη ακρίβεια προτροπής και δεν απαιτεί ετικέτες επίγειας αλήθειας.', 'hu': 'Az előkészített nyelvi modellek jelentős nyelvi és tényszerű ismereteket nyernek azokból a masszív corporákból, amelyekre képezték őket, és a prompt engineering igyekszik ezeket a modelleket konkrét feladatokhoz igazítani. Sajnos a meglévő prompt tervezési módszerek jelentős mennyiségű címkézett adatot, modellparaméterekhez való hozzáférést vagy mindkettőt igényelnek. Bevezetünk egy új módszert a \\textit{feliratozott példák nélkül} és \\textit{prompt sablonok kiválasztására, közvetlen hozzáférés nélkül a modell}. Konkrétan a jelölt sablonok során kiválasztjuk azt a sablont, amely maximalizálja a bemenet és a megfelelő modell kimenet közötti kölcsönös információt. A 7 különböző NLP feladatot képviselő 8 adatkészleten megmutatjuk, hogy ha egy sablon nagy kölcsönös információval rendelkezik, akkor nagy pontossággal rendelkezik a feladatban. A legnagyobb modellnél az utasítások kiválasztása módszerünkkel az átlagos pontosságtól a legjobb pontosságig 90\\%-ot kap, és nem igényel alapvető igazságcímkéket.', 'ka': 'პირველ განსწავლებული ენის მოდელები იქნება მნიშვნელოვანი ენგურილისტიკური და ფაქტიური ცნობიერები მასიური კორპორაზე, რომელიც ისინი განსწავლია, და სწრაფად ინგენერიცია იძება ამ მოდელების გან მართლად, მსგავსი წარმოდგენილური ინგენერიციის მეთოდიები უნდა იყოს მნიშვნელოვანი მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები, მოდელური პარამეტრები, ან ორი Name განსაკუთრებულია, კანდიდენტის შაბლონის ნაწილზე, ჩვენ არჩევით შაბლონი, რომელიც შეიძლება გადატანა ერთადერთი ინფორმაციას და შესაძლებელი მოდელის გამოსვლა. 8 მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც 7 განსხვავებული NLP დავალებებით, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ როდესაც შაბლონის შაბლონის საერთო ინფორმაცია უფრო დიდი, მაგრამ ეს დავალებში უ უფრო დიდი მოდელში, ჩვენი მეტისთვის მონიშნეთ წარმოდგენები 90\\% მიიღებს საშუალო წარმოდგენებიდან საუკეთესო წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენება და არაფერი სინამდგენების ლა', 'it': "I modelli linguistici pre-addestrati derivano sostanziali conoscenze linguistiche e fattuali dai corpi massicci su cui sono formati, e la prompt engineering cerca di allineare questi modelli a compiti specifici. Sfortunatamente, i metodi di prompt engineering esistenti richiedono quantità significative di dati etichettati, accesso ai parametri del modello o entrambi. Introducemo un nuovo metodo per selezionare i modelli di prompt \\textit{senza esempi etichettati} e \\textit{senza accesso diretto al modello}. Nello specifico, su un insieme di modelli candidati, scegliamo il modello che massimizza le informazioni reciproche tra l'input e l'output del modello corrispondente. Attraverso 8 set di dati che rappresentano 7 distinte attività NLP, mostriamo che quando un modello ha un'elevata informazione reciproca, ha anche un'elevata precisione sul compito. Sul modello più grande, la selezione dei prompt con il nostro metodo ottiene il 90\\% del percorso dalla precisione media dei prompt alla migliore accuratezza dei prompt e non richiede etichette di verità di fondo.", 'kk': 'Алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілері өзінің оқылған корпорасынан маңызды лингвистикалық және фактикалық білім береді. Бұл үлгілерді керек тапсырмаларда түзету үшін инженерлікті сұрау керек. Кешіріңіз, бар сұрақ инженерлік әдістері жарлық деректер, үлгі параметрлерге қатынау немесе екеуінде маңызды сандарды талап етеді. Біз сұраныс үлгілерін\\ textit{ жарлық мәселелерімен\\ textit{ дегенді таңдау үшін жаңа әдісін келтіреміз. Ескерту үлгілерінің бірнеше ретінде, келтірілген мәліметті және сәйкес үлгілердің шығысының арасындағы көбірек мәліметті кең жаю үлгісін таңдаймыз. 8 деректер қорларында 7 түрлі NLP тапсырмаларын көрсетеді. Біз үлгісінің бірнеше бірнеше мәліметі жоғары болғанда тапсырманың дұрыстығы жоғары болады. Ең үлкен үлгісінде, әдіміздің сұрақтарын таңдау орташа сұрақтарының дұрыстығынан 90\\% деп сұрақтайды.', 'mk': 'Pre-trained language models derive substantial linguistic and factual knowledge from the massive corpora on which they are trained, and prompt engineering seeks to align these models to specific tasks.  За жал, постојните брзи инженерски методи бараат значителни количини на обележани податоци, пристап до параметрите на моделот или двете. We introduce a new method for selecting prompt templates \\textit{without labeled examples} and \\textit{without direct access to the model}.  Specifically, over a set of candidate templates, we choose the template that maximizes the mutual information between the input and the corresponding model output.  Покрај 8 податоци кои претставуваат 7 различни NLP задачи, покажуваме дека кога шаблон има високи взаемни информации, исто така има висока прецизност во задачата. На најголемиот модел, изборот на информации со нашиот метод добива 90\\% од патот од просечната брза точност до најдобрата брза точност и не бара ознаки на основната вистина.', 'lt': 'Iš anksto apmokyti kalbos modeliai gauna didelių kalbų ir faktinių žinių iš didžiosios korporacijos, kurioje jie mokomi, ir greita inžinerija siekia suderinti šiuos modelius su konkrečiomis užduotimis. Deja, dabartiniams greitos inžinerijos metodams reikia daug ženklintų duomenų, prieigos prie modelio parametrų arba abiejų. Įdiegiame naują metodą, skirtą pasirinkti skubius šablonus \\textit{be pažymėtų pavyzdžių} ir \\textit{be tiesioginės prieigos prie modelio}. Konkrečiai, per keletą kandidatų šablonų mes pasirinkame šabloną, kuris maksimaliai padidina abipusę informaciją tarp įvedimo ir atitinkamo modelio išvedimo. Iš 8 duomenų rinkinių, kurie sudaro 7 atskiras NLP užduotis, matyti, kad kai šablonas turi didelę abipusę informaciją, jis taip pat turi didelį tikslumą užduotyje. Pagal didžiausią model į, pasirinkus įspėjimus pagal mūsų metodą, 90\\% kelio gauna nuo vidutinio greito tikslumo iki geriausio greito tikslumo ir nereikalaujama antžeminių tiesos ženklų.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa yang dilatih dahulu menghasilkan pengetahuan bahasa dan fakta yang penting dari korpra besar yang mereka dilatih, dan jurutera cepat cuba untuk menyesuaikan model ini dengan tugas tertentu. Malangnya, kaedah rekayasa yang ada memerlukan jumlah yang signifikan data yang ditabel, akses ke parameter model, atau kedua-dua. We introduce a new method for selecting prompt templates \\textit{without labeled examples} and \\textit{without direct access to the model}.  Specifically, over a set of candidate templates, we choose the template that maximizes the mutual information between the input and the corresponding model output.  Melalui 8 set data yang mewakili 7 tugas NLP yang berbeza, kita menunjukkan bahawa apabila templat mempunyai maklumat bersama yang tinggi, ia juga mempunyai ketepatan tinggi pada tugas. Pada model terbesar, memilih maklumat dengan kaedah kami mendapat 90\\% dari cara dari ketepatan maklumat rata-rata ke ketepatan maklumat terbaik dan memerlukan tiada label kebenaran tanah.', 'mt': "Il-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel iġibu għarfien lingwistiku u fattwali sostanzjali mill-korpora massiva li fuqha huma mħarrġa, u l-inġinerija fil-pront tfittex li tallinja dawn il-mudelli ma’ kompiti speċifiċi. Sfortunatament, il-metodi ta’ inġinerija rapida eżistenti jeħtieġu ammonti sinifikanti ta’ dejta ttikkettata, aċċess għal parametri mudell, jew it-tnejn li huma. Aħna nintroduċu metodu ġdid għall-għa żla ta' mudelli fil-pront \\textit{mingħajr eżempji ttikkettati} u \\textit{mingħajr aċċess dirett għall-mudell}. Speċifikament, fuq sett ta’ mudelli kandidati, a ħna nagħżlu l-mudell li jimmassimizza l-informazzjoni reċiproka bejn l-input u l-output tal-mudell korrispondenti. Fuq tmien settijiet ta’ dejta li jirrappreżentaw seba’ kompiti distinti tal-NLP, nuru li meta mudell ikollu informazzjoni reċiproka għolja, għandu wkoll preċiżjoni għolja dwar il-kompitu. Fuq l-akbar mudell, l-għażla tal-pronti bil-metodu tagħna tikseb 90\\% tat-triq mill-medja tal-preċiżjoni fil-pront sal-aħjar preċiżjoni fil-pront u ma teħtieġ l-ebda tikketta tal-verità tal-art.", 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварууд нь сургалтын үндсэн хэлний болон үндсэн мэдлэг үүсгэдэг. Эдгээр загваруудыг тодорхой ажлын тухай инженерчлэл зохион байгуулахыг хичээдэг. Харамсалтай нь суурилсан хурдан инженерчлэлийн арга нь тодорхой хэмжээний мэдээлэл, загварын параметр, эсвэл хоёуланг ашиглах хэрэгтэй. Бид тэмдэглэгдсэн жишээ биш \\textit{ болон \\textit{загвар руу шууд хүрэхгүй шууд арга загварыг сонгох шинэ арга загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Тодорхой хэлбэл, захирагчийн хувьд бид харилцааны мэдээллийг оруулах болон харилцааны загварын гаргах хоорондын хамгийн их хэмжээний хувьд сонгож байна. 8 өгөгдлийн сангууд нь 7 төрлийн NLP даалгаврыг илэрхийлдэг. Бид шалгалтын хувьд харилцааны өндөр мэдээлэл байхад үүнийг даалгавраа маш нарийн байдаг. Хамгийн том загвар дээр бидний арга загварыг сонгох нь дундаж тодорхойлолтоос хамгийн хурдан тодорхойлолтоос 90% гарч ирнэ. Үнэндээ жинхэнэ загвар хэрэггүй.', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe czerpią znaczną wiedzę językową i faktyczną z masywnych korpusów, na których są szkolone, a promocyjna inżynieria dąży do dostosowania tych modeli do konkretnych zadań. Niestety istniejące metody szybkiej inżynierii wymagają znacznej ilości etykietowanych danych, dostępu do parametrów modelu lub obu. Wprowadzamy nową metodę wyboru szablonów zapytania \\textit{bez etykietowanych przykładów} i \\textit{bez bezpośredniego dostępu do modelu}. W szczególności, nad zestawem szablonów kandydatów, wybieramy szablon, który maksymalizuje wzajemne informacje między wejściem a odpowiednim wyjściem modelu. W 8-ciu zbiorach danych reprezentujących siedem różnych zadań NLP pokazujemy, że gdy szablon ma wysoką wzajemną informację, ma również wysoką dokładność zadania. W największym modelu wybór zapytań za pomocą naszej metody uzyskuje 90\\% drogi od średniej dokładności zapytania do najlepszej dokładności zapytania i nie wymaga żadnych podstawowych etykiet prawdy.', 'no': 'Førehandsvis språk-modeller får stor språk og faktisk kunnskap frå den massive korpora dei er trent på, og spør ingeniøren søk å alignera desse modelane til spesifikke oppgåver. Dessverre krev dei eksisterande spørjingsverdimetodane signifikante mengdar merkelige data, tilgang til modeller eller begge. Vi introduserer ein ny metode for å velja spørsmålmalar\\\\ textit{ utan merkelige eksemplar} og\\\\ textit{ utan direkte tilgang til modellen}. Spesifikke over eit sett av kandidatmalar, vel vi malen som maksimerer mellom inndata og tilsvarande modelleutdata. Mellom 8 datasett som representerer 7 ulike NLP- oppgåver, viser vi at når ein mal har høg samanlig informasjon, har det også høg nøyaktighet på oppgåva. På den største modellen kan du velja spørsmål med metoden vårt få 90 %.', 'sr': 'Pre-obučeni jezički modeli proizvode značajno jezičko i činjenično znanje od masivne korpore na kojoj su obučeni, i brzo inženjerstvo pokušava da uključi te modele na posebne zadatke. Nažalost, postojeće brze inženjerske metode zahtevaju značajne količine označenih podataka, pristup modelima ili oboje. Predstavljamo novu metodu za izbor brzog šablona \\textit{bez etiketiranih primjera} i \\textit{bez direktnog pristupa modelu}. Posebno, preko set a kandidatskih šablona, izabrali smo šablon koji maksimalizuje zajedničku informaciju između ulaza i odgovarajućeg izlaza modela. Kroz 8 podataka koji predstavljaju 7 različitih NLP zadataka, pokazujemo da kada šablon ima visoke zajedničke informacije, takođe ima veliku tačnost na zadatku. Na najvećem modelu, odabranje brzina sa našim metodom dobija 90% od prosječne brzine tačnosti do najbrže tačnosti i ne zahteva oznake istine.', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വലിയ ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ജ്ഞാനവും കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അതില്\u200d നിന്നും അവര്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലനം നല്\u200dകപ്പെടുന് ഭാഗ്യവശാലം, നിലവിലുള്ള പ്രാപ്റ്റ് എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങ് രീതികള്\u200d ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, മോഡല്\u200d പരാമീറ്ററുകളില്\u200d പ്രവേശിക് പ്രാപ്റ്റ് മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ രീതിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു\\ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഒരു കൂട്ടം മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമേല്\u200d, ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിനുമിടയിലെ പരസ്പര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വലുതാക്കുന് 7 വ്യത്യസ്തമായ എംഎല്\u200dപി ജോലികളെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന 8 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു, ഒരു വാലപ്പെട്ട്  ഏറ്റവും വലിയ മോഡലില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രോപ്റ്റ് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d 90% രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഏറ്റവും വേഗത്തില്\u200d കൃത്യമ', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite derivă cunoștințe lingvistice și factuale substanțiale din corpurile masive pe care sunt instruite, iar ingineria promptă caută să alinieze aceste modele la sarcini specifice. Din păcate, metodele de proiectare existente necesită cantități semnificative de date etichetate, acces la parametrii modelului sau ambele. Introducem o nouă metodă de selectare a șabloanelor prompt \\textit{fără exemple etichetate} și \\textit{fără acces direct la model}. Mai exact, peste un set de șabloane candidate, alegem șablonul care maximizează informațiile reciproce dintre intrare și ieșirea modelului corespunzător. Pe parcursul a 8 seturi de date reprezentând 7 sarcini PNL distincte, arătăm că atunci când un șablon are informații reciproce ridicate, are, de asemenea, o precizie ridicată asupra sarcinii. Pe cel mai mare model, selectarea solicitărilor cu metoda noastră obține 90\\% din drum de la o precizie medie promptă la cea mai bună precizie promptă și nu necesită etichete de adevăr la sol.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල්ස් වලින් විශේෂ භාෂාව සහ ඇත්ත දැනගන්නවා ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු කොර්පෝරාවෙන් ගොඩක් ලොකු දේශ අවාසනාවෙන්න, තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරවේශය ඉන්ජිනිජින් විධානය අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා ලේබල් කරපු දත්ත, ප්\u200dරවේශය ප්\u200dරව Name විශේෂයෙන්ම, ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණාත්මක විශේෂය විශේෂ NLP වැඩක් 7ක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන දත්ත සෙට් 8 වලින්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ටෙම්ප්ලේට් එක්ක අනුමුණු තොරතුරු තියෙනවම ලොකු මොඩල් එක්ක, අපේ විධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරොම්ප්ට් එක්ක තෝරාගන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරොම්ප්ට් එක්ක 90\\% විධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරොම්ප්ට් සිද', 'sv': 'Förutbildade språkmodeller härleder betydande språkliga och faktiska kunskaper från de massiva korpora som de utbildas på, och prompt engineering försöker anpassa dessa modeller till specifika uppgifter. Tyvärr kräver befintliga prompt engineering betydande mängder märkta data, tillgång till modellparametrar eller båda. Vi introducerar en ny metod för att välja promptmallar \\textit{utan märkta exempel} och \\textit{utan direkt tillgång till modellen}. Specifikt väljer vi över en uppsättning kandidatmallar den mall som maximerar den ömsesidiga informationen mellan indata och motsvarande modellutgång. Över 8 datauppsättningar som representerar 7 olika NLP-uppgifter visar vi att när en mall har hög ömsesidig information, har den också hög noggrannhet på uppgiften. På den största modellen får val av prompter med vår metod 90\\% av vägen från genomsnittlig prompt noggrannhet till bästa prompt noggrannhet och kräver inga marksanningsetiketter.', 'ur': 'پہلے کی تعلیم کی زبان نمونڈل بڑی زبان اور حقیقی علم کی وجہ سے ہے جہاں وہ تعلیم کی جاتی ہیں، اور انجینیاں کی پیغام دیتی ہے کہ ان نمونڈلوں کو مخصوص کاموں کے ساتھ ملنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے. بدبختی ہے، موجود پورٹ انجینرینگ طریقے لکڑے ہوئے ڈاٹے کے مطابق ضرورت ہیں، موڈل پارامتروں کی دسترسی، یا دونوں. ہم نے ایک نئی طریقہ معلوم کرتا ہے کہ پورٹ ٹیپلٹ\\ textit{بغیر لکیٹ کی مثالیں} اور \\textit{بغیر مدل کی دسترسی بغیر مخصوص طور پر، کاندینڈیٹ ٹیپلٹ کے ایک سٹ پر، ہم ٹیپلٹ کو انتخاب کرتے ہیں جو اینپیٹ اور مناسب موڈل آئٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ 8 ڈاٹ سٹ کے پاس 7 مختلف NLP ٹاکس کی نمایش کرتے ہیں، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ جب ایک ٹیپلٹ کے پاس بلند آپس کی معلومات ہے، اس کے لئے بھی کام پر بالا دقیق ہے. سب سے بڑے موڈل پر، ہمارے طریقے کے ساتھ پورٹ کا انتخاب کرنا، متوسط دقیق سے 90° درصد سے بہترین دقیق تک حاصل کرتا ہے اور کوئی زمین حقیقت لابل کی ضرورت نہیں ہے.', 'so': 'Tusaalooyinka afka hore oo la tababaray waxay ka helaan aqoonta luuqada iyo aqoonta runta ah oo ka mid ah shirkadda aad u badan oo lagu baranayo, oo injiilku wuxuu doonayaa in uu sameyno qaababkan si gaar ah u shaqeeyo. Nasiib la’aanta waxaa u baahan qaababka maamulka oo dhaqsaha ah oo ku jirta oo ay u baahan yihiin tiro aad u badan oo sawir ah, si aad u hesho parameters model ama labadoodaba. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab cusub oo aan dooranayno macluumaad dhaqso ah Si gaar ah, waxaynu dooranaynaa macluumaadka ku dhexeeya gudaha midibka iyo midhaha midibka oo isku mid ah. Waxaad ka heleysaa 8 macluumaadyo oo ka mid ah 7 shaqooyin oo kala duduwan oo NLP ah, waxaynu muujinaynaa in marka macluumaad dheer oo iskala xiriira, waxaa sidoo kale saameyn dheer ku leh shaqada. Tusaale ahaan ugu weyn, oo ku doorasha qaababkayaga waxaa laga helaa 90/boqolkiiba jidka ugu dhaqdhaqaaqa saxda ugu wanaagsan, mana baahna calaamada runta ah ee dhulka.', 'ta': 'முன்பு பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் பெரிய மொழி மொழி மொழி மற்றும் உண்மையான அறிவு வழங்கப்படுகிறது, அதில் அவர்களுக்கு பயிற்சி அளிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, பொ துரதிர்ஷ்டவசமாக, இருக்கும் வேகமான பொறியியல் முறைமைகள் குறிப்பிட்ட தரவு, மாதிரி அளபுருக்கள் அணுகல் அல்லது இருவரும் தேவ We introduce a new method for selecting prompt templates \\textit{without labeled examples} and \\textit{without direct access to the model}.  குறிப்பிட்டு, ஒரு சில வார்ப்புருவின் வார்ப்புருக்களுக்கு மேல், உள்ளீடு மற்றும் ஒத்திருக்கும் மாதிரி வெளியீட்டிற 8 வித்தியாசமான NLP பணிகளை குறிப்பிடும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு மேலும், வார்ப்புருவில் உயர்ந்த பங்கு தகவல் இருந்தால், பணியி பெரிய மாதிரியில், எங்கள் முறைமையில் விரைவுகளை தேர்ந்தெடுத்தால் சராசரி சரியான சரியில் இருந்து சரியான வேகமான திட்டத்திற்கு 90/விழ', 'vi': 'Những mô hình ngôn ngữ đã được đào tạo có nguồn kiến thức về ngôn ngữ ngữ và sự thật quan trọng từ tập đoàn lớn mà họ được đào tạo, và kỹ sư nhanh chóng muốn kết hợp các mô hình này với các nhiệm vụ cụ thể. Thật không may, các phương pháp kỹ thuật đúng giờ hiện có đòi hỏi một lượng lớn dữ liệu dán nhãn, truy cập vào các thông số mô hình, hoặc cả hai. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp mới để chọn Mẫu nhắc nhắc \\ textit Dễ mà không có ví dụ. và\\ textit Dễ mà không có quyền truy cập trực tiếp vào mô hình. Cụ thể hơn, trên một tập mẫu của ứng viên, chúng tôi chọn mẫu tối đa hóa thông tin lẫn nhau giữa kết xuất nhập và kết xuất mẫu tương ứng. Bên ngoài 8 các tập tin đại diện cho nhiệm vụ 75 khác nhau, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng khi mẫu có thông tin chung cao, nó cũng có độ chính xác cao trong nhiệm vụ. Trên mô hình lớn nhất, việc chọn các lời nhắc với phương pháp của chúng ta nhận được 90\\\\\\\\\\ của con đường từ chính xác nhắc trung bình cho đúng đúng giờ tốt nhất và không đòi hỏi nhãn chân lý mặt đất.', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi tillar modellari juda katta tillar va haqiqiqiy maʼlumotga ega bo'ladi, va ular o'rganilgan katta kompaniyadan o'rganish va muhandiya bu modellarni foydalanishga tayyorlashni istaysiz. Uzunasizki, mavjud tez muhandiya usullar yozilgan maʼlumot, model parametrlariga murojaat qilish kerak. @ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Across 8 datasets representing 7 distinct NLP tasks, we show that when a template has high mutual information, it also has high accuracy on the task.  Bu katta modelda, bizning usuli bilan ishlatiladigan soʻzlarni o'zgartirish, o'rtacha soni 90% yoʻlni eng yaxshi tashkilotga ishlatiladi va eng yaxshi to ʻgʻri toʻgʻri notatga yetarli emas.", 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide taalmodellen ontlenen substantiële linguïstische en feitelijke kennis van de enorme corpora waarop ze worden getraind, en prompt engineering probeert deze modellen af te stemmen op specifieke taken. Helaas vereisen bestaande prompt engineering methoden aanzienlijke hoeveelheden gelabelde gegevens, toegang tot modelparameters of beide. We introduceren een nieuwe methode voor het selecteren van promptsjablonen \\textit{zonder gelabelde voorbeelden} en \\textit{zonder directe toegang tot het model}. In het bijzonder kiezen we over een set kandidaatsjablonen het sjabloon dat de wederzijdse informatie tussen de invoer en de bijbehorende modelausgang maximaliseert. In acht datasets die zeven verschillende NLP-taken vertegenwoordigen, laten we zien dat wanneer een sjabloon hoge wederzijdse informatie heeft, het ook een hoge nauwkeurigheid van de taak heeft. Op het grootste model krijgt het selecteren van prompts met onze methode 90\\% van de weg van de gemiddelde promptnauwkeurigheid naar de beste promptnauwkeurigheid en vereist geen ground truth labels.', 'hr': 'Preobučeni jezički modeli proizvode značajne jezičke i činjenične znanje od masivne korporacije na kojoj su obučeni, a brzo inženjerstvo pokušava uskladiti te modele na posebne zadatke. Nažalost, postojeće brze inženjerske metode zahtijevaju značajne količine označenih podataka, pristup modelima ili oboje. Predstavljamo novu metodu za izbor brzog šablona \\ textit {bez označenih primjera} i \\ textit {bez direktnog pristupa modelu}. Posebno, preko set a kandidatskih šablona, odaberemo šablon koji maksimira zajedničku informaciju između ulaza i odgovarajućeg izlaza modela. Kroz 8 podataka koji predstavljaju 7 različitih NLP zadataka, pokazujemo da kada šablon ima visoke zajedničke informacije, također ima visoke preciznosti na zadatku. Na najvećem modelu, odabranje brzina s našim metodom dobiva 90% načina od prosječne brzine to čnosti do najbrže točnosti i ne zahtijeva oznake istine.', 'da': 'Forududdannede sprogmodeller udleder betydelig sproglig og faktisk viden fra de massive korpora, som de er uddannet på, og prompt engineering søger at tilpasse disse modeller til specifikke opgaver. Desværre kræver eksisterende prompt engineering metoder betydelige mængder mærkede data, adgang til modelparametre eller begge dele. Vi introducerer en ny metode til at vælge prompt skabeloner \\textit{uden mærkede eksempler} og \\textit{uden direkte adgang til modellen}. Specielt vælger vi over et sæt kandidatskabeloner den skabelon, der maksimerer den gensidige information mellem input og den tilsvarende model output. På tværs af 8 datasæt, der repræsenterer 7 forskellige NLP-opgaver, viser vi, at når en skabelon har høj gensidig information, har den også høj nøjagtighed på opgaven. På den største model får valg af prompter med vores metode 90\\% af vejen fra den gennemsnitlige prompt nøjagtighed til den bedste prompt nøjagtighed og kræver ingen jordsandhed etiketter.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte Sprachmodelle beziehen erhebliches linguistisches und sachliches Wissen aus den massiven Korpora, auf denen sie trainiert werden, und prompt engineering versucht, diese Modelle auf spezifische Aufgaben auszurichten. Leider erfordern vorhandene prompt engineering Methoden erhebliche Mengen an markierten Daten, Zugriff auf Modellparameter oder beides. Wir führen eine neue Methode zur Auswahl von Eingabeaufforderungsvorlagen \\textit{ohne beschriftete Beispiele} und \\textit{ohne direkten Zugriff auf das Modell} ein. Insbesondere wählen wir über eine Reihe von Kandidatenvorlagen die Vorlage aus, die die gegenseitigen Informationen zwischen der Eingabe und der entsprechenden Modellausgabe maximiert. In acht Datensätzen, die sieben verschiedene NLP-Aufgaben darstellen, zeigen wir, dass eine Vorlage, die hohe gegenseitige Informationen enthält, auch eine hohe Genauigkeit für die Aufgabe aufweist. Beim größten Modell erhält die Auswahl von Eingabeaufforderungen mit unserer Methode 90\\% des Weges von der durchschnittlichen Eingabeaufforderungsgenauigkeit zur besten Eingabeaufforderungsgenauigkeit und erfordert keine Ground Truth Labels.', 'id': 'Model bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya menghasilkan pengetahuan bahasa dan fakta yang besar dari korpra besar di mana mereka dilatih, dan insinyur cepat berusaha untuk menyesuaikan model ini dengan tugas spesifik. Sayangnya, metode rekayasa cepat yang ada membutuhkan jumlah yang signifikan dari data yang ditabel, akses ke parameter model, atau keduanya. Kami memperkenalkan metode baru untuk memilih templat prompt \\textit{tanpa contoh labeled} dan \\textit{tanpa akses langsung ke model}. Secara spesifik, melalui set templat kandidat, kami memilih templat yang memaksimalkan informasi antara input dan output model yang sesuai. Melalui 8 set data yang mewakili 7 tugas NLP yang berbeda, kami menunjukkan bahwa ketika sebuah templat memiliki informasi yang sama tinggi, ia juga memiliki akurasi tinggi pada tugas. On the largest model, selecting prompts with our method gets 90\\% of the way from the average prompt accuracy to the best prompt accuracy and requires no ground truth labels.', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 언어 모델은 대량의 어료 라이브러리에서 대량의 언어와 사실 지식을 얻고prompt engineering은 이러한 모델을 특정한 임무와 결합시키려고 한다.불행하게도 기존의 빠른 공사 방법은 대량의 표기 데이터, 접근 모델 매개 변수 또는 둘을 겸비해야 한다.알림 템플릿을 선택하는 새로운 방법\\textit{탭이 없는 예시}과 \\textit{모델에 직접 접근하지 않음}을 소개했습니다.구체적으로 말하면 한 그룹의 후보 템플릿에서 우리는 입력과 상응하는 모델 출력 사이의 상호 정보를 최대화하는 템플릿을 선택한다.7개의 서로 다른 NLP 작업을 나타내는 8개의 데이터 세트에서 템플릿이 높은 상호 정보를 가지고 있을 때 작업에서도 높은 정밀도를 가진다는 것을 알 수 있습니다.가장 큰 모델에서 우리의 방법으로 힌트를 선택하면 평균 힌트 정확도에서 최적 힌트 정확도의 90% 를 얻을 수 있고 지면 진상 라벨이 필요하지 않다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبان\u200cهای زیادی از دانش زبان\u200cشناسی و حقیقی از شرکت\u200cهای بزرگی که در آن آموزش می\u200cشوند، می\u200cگیرند، و مهندسی پیش\u200cآموزش می\u200cخواهد این مدل\u200cها را به وظیفه\u200cهای خاص تطبیق دهد. متاسفانه، روش مهندسی پیشگیری موجود تعداد زیادی از داده های برچسب، دسترسی به پارامترهای مدل یا هر دو نیاز دارد. Name مخصوصاً بر روی یک مجموعه از قالبهای کاندیدات، ما قالب را انتخاب می کنیم که اطلاعات مشترک بین ورودی و نتیجه مدل مشترک را maximize می کند. در طول ۸ مجموعه داده\u200cها که 7 کار NLP متفاوت را نمایش می\u200cدهند، نشان می\u200cدهیم که وقتی یک قالب اطلاعات متفاوتی بالا دارد، دقیق بالا در این کار دارد. در بزرگترین مدل، انتخاب پیشنهاد با روش ما ۹۰ درصد راه از متوسط دقیق به بهترین دقیق سریع می\u200cرسد و نیازی به نقاشی حقیقت زمینی ندارد.', 'tr': 'Öňki bilim sistemasy bilen öňki dil nusgalary çykarypdyr. Bu nusgalary belli işlere çykarmak üçin örän uly dil we hakyky bilgilerinden çykarypdyr. Gynansakda bolan sowgat enjiniýasynyň hili sanlary etitlenýän maglumatlary, nusga parameterlere goll etmek üçin gerek. Biz \\textit{nusgalary diňlemeden} we \\textit{nusgalaryny diňlemek üçin täze bir yöntem girdiririk. Açmak üçin kandidat nusgalaryň arasynda, nusgalaryň we bellenen nusgalaryň arasynda maksimal maglumaty saýlaýrys. 8 sany öňünde NLP netijesini reprezentar 7 sany takyk eden sany, biz bir nusgada owadan maglumatyň ýokary bar we munyň işiň derejesi ýokary bar. Iň uly modelde, biziň yönümiz bilen soraglary saýlamak ortalama dogrylygyndan iň gowy prompt dogrylygyna çevrilýär we asla çynyň etiketleri gerek bolmaz.', 'af': "Vorige opgelei taal modele verkry substantiele lingvisse en faktuurlike kennis van die massiewe korpora waarop hulle opgelei word, en vra inženiering soek om hierdie modele te aligneer na spesifieke taak. Ongelukkig, bestaande prompt inženieringsmetodes benodig betekende hoeveelheid etiketeerde data, toegang tot model parameters, of beide. Ons introduseer 'n nuwe metode vir kies prompt templates\\\\ textit{sonder gemerkte voorbeelde} en\\\\ textit{sonder direk toegang tot die model}. Spesifieke, bo' n stel van kandidate sjabloane, ons kies die sjabloon wat maksimeer die gemeenskaplike inligting tussen die invoer en die ooreenstemmende model uitset. Deur 8 datastelle wat 7 verskillende NLP taak verteenwoordig, wys ons dat wanneer 'n sjabloon hoog gemeenskaplike inligting het, dit het ook hoog presisie op die taak. Op die grootste model, kies prompte met ons metode kry 90\\% van die pad van die gemiddelde prompt presies na die beste prompt presies en benodig geen grondwaarheid etikette.", 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha zilizofundishwa kabla hupata ufahamu mkubwa wa lugha na ukweli kutoka kwa makampuni makubwa ambayo hufundishwa, na kuanzisha uhandisi unalenga kutengeneza mifano hii ili kufanya kazi maalum. Kwa bahati mbaya, mbinu za uhandisi zinazopo haraka zinahitaji kiasi kikubwa cha taarifa zinazowekwa, upatikanaji wa vipimo vya mifano, au hata hivyo. Tunaonyesha mbinu mpya ya kuchagua namba za haraka \\textit {bila mifano yoyote iliyotumika} na \\textit {bila kupata moja kwa moja kwa moja kwenye mifano}. Kwa hakika, zaidi ya baadhi ya namba za wagombea, tunachagua namba ambazo zinaongezea taarifa za pamoja kati ya input na matokeo yanayofanana. Across 8 datasets representing 7 distinct NLP tasks, we show that when a template has high mutual information, it also has high accuracy on the task.  Katika mtindo mkubwa, kuchagua haraka kwa njia yetu inapata asilimia 90/ya njia ya kawaida kutoka kwa usahihi wa kiwango cha haraka mpaka ukweli mzuri na hakuna hitaji alama za ukweli wa ardhi.', 'sq': 'Modelet e paratrajnuara të gjuhës nxjerrin njohuri thelbësore gjuhësore dhe faktike nga korpora masive në të cilën janë trajnuar dhe inxhinieri i shpejtë kërkon të përshtatet këto modele me detyra specifike. Fatkeqësisht, metodat ekzistuese të shpejta të inxhinierisë kërkojnë sasi të rëndësishme të të dhënave të etiketuara, akses në parametrat e modelit, apo të dyja. Ne prezantojmë një metodë të re për zgjedhjen e modeleve prompt \\textit{pa shembuj të etiketuar} dhe \\textit{pa akses të drejtpërdrejtë në modelin}. Veçanërisht, mbi një sërë modelesh kandidate, ne zgjedhim modelin që maksimizon informacionin e ndërsjelltë midis hyrjes dhe daljes së modelit korrispondues. Përmes 8 grupeve të dhënash që përfaqësojnë 7 detyra të veçanta NLP, ne tregojmë se kur një model ka informacion të lartë të ndërsjelltë, ai ka gjithashtu saktësi të lartë në detyrë. Në modelin më të madh, zgjedhja e kërkesave me metodën tonë merr 90\\% të rrugës nga saktësia mesatare e shpejtë deri në saktësinë më të mirë të shpejtë dhe nuk kërkon etiketa të vërtetës tokësore.', 'am': 'ተማሪዎች የቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች ብዙ ቋንቋዎች እና እውነተኛ እውቀት ከኮርፖርተር ይወስዳሉ፤ የኢንጂንቨርስቲም ምሳሌዎችን ለቁጥጥር ስራ እንዲያሰናከል ይፈልጋል፡፡ Unfortunately, existing prompt engineering methods require significant amounts of labeled data, access to model parameters, or both.  templates-action በተለየ ጊዜ የጭብጥ ምርጫዎች በጭብጥ ምረጡ ላይ በይዞታዎች እና በሞዴል ውጤቶች መካከል የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን በመጨመር የምንመርጠው template ወደ 8 ልዩ NLP ስራዎችን በሚያሳየቁ የዳታ ሳታተሮች ክፍል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በተለጠቀው ምሳሌ፣ በሥርዓታችን የመረጠውን ጽሑፎች ከመተላለፊው ቁጥጥር 90\\በመቶ የሚሆነውን መንገድ ይዞራል፡፡', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените езикови модели извличат значителни езикови и фактически знания от масивните корпуси, върху които са обучени, и бързото инженерство се стреми да приведе тези модели в съответствие с конкретни задачи. За съжаление, съществуващите бързи инженерни методи изискват значителни количества етикетирани данни, достъп до параметри на модела или и двете. Въвеждаме нов метод за избор на шаблони за подкани \\textit{ без етикетирани примери} и \\textit{ без директен достъп до модела}. По-конкретно, над набор от шаблони за кандидати, ние избираме шаблона, който максимизира взаимната информация между входа и съответния изход на модела. В 8 набора от данни, представляващи 7 различни задачи за НЛП, ние показваме, че когато шаблон има висока взаимна информация, той също има висока точност на задачата. При най-големия модел изборът на подкани с нашия метод получава 90\\% от пътя от средната точност на подканите до най-добрата точност на подканите и не изисква етикети на истината.', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri təhsil edilmiş böyük korporadan böyük dil və faktiski bilgiləri təhsil edir və bu modelləri müəyyən etmək üçün tələb edir. Necə olaraq, mövcud tələb inženjeri metodları etiketli məlumatların, modellərin parametrlərinə istifadə etməsi və ya hər ikisini istəyirlər. Biz məsəlləri olmadan \\textit{ və \\\\textit{ modeli əlaqəsi olmadan tələb edilən nümunələri seçmək üçün yeni bir metod təşkil edirik. Beləliklə, kandidát nömrələrinin bir quruluğu üstündə, biz nömrünü seçirik ki, girdi və nömrü nömrəsinin arasındakı məlumatları böyükləyir. 7 müxtəlif NLP işlərini göstərən 8 verilən qurğular arasında göstəririk ki, bir şablon arasındakı yüksək məlumatlar olduğunda, işdə yüksək doğruluğu da var. Ən böyük modellərdə, metodumuzun tərzlərini seçmək ortalama tərzindən tərzlərin doğruluğuna qədər 90%-ini alır və heç bir yerdə haqq etiketlərini istəməz.', 'bs': 'Preobučeni jezički modeli proizvode značajne jezičke i činjenične znanje od masivne korpore na kojoj su obučeni, i brzo inženjerstvo pokušava da priključi te modele specifičnim zadatkima. Nažalost, postojeće brze inženjerske metode zahtijevaju značajne količine označenih podataka, pristup modelima ili oboje. Predstavljamo novu metodu za biranje brzog šablona \\textit{bez etiketiranih primjera} i \\textit{bez direktnog pristupa modelu}. Posebno, preko set a kandidatskih šablona, odaberemo šablon koji maksimalizira zajedničku informaciju između ulaza i odgovarajućeg izlaza modela. Kroz 8 podataka koji predstavljaju 7 različitih NLP zadataka, pokazujemo da kada šablon ima visoke zajedničke informacije, također ima visoke preciznosti na zadatku. Na najvećem modelu, odabranje brzina sa našim metodom dobija 90% načina od prosječne brzine tačnosti do najbrže tačnosti i ne zahtijeva oznake istine.', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে ভাষার মডেল বিশাল ভাষার ভাষা এবং সত্যিকারের জ্ঞান থেকে প্রযুক্তি প্রদান করেছে, যেখানে তারা প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেছে এবং প্ দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, বিদ্রুতভাবে বিদ্রুত ইঞ্জিনিয়ান পদ্ধতি বিদ্যমান লেবেল ডাটা প্রয়োজন, মডেল প্যারামিটার প্রবেশ, অথবা  প্রাপ্ত মন্দির নির্বাচনের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি চিহ্নিত করেছি \\টেক্সটিট {লেবেলেখা ছাড়া} এবং\\টেক্সটিট {মডেলে সরাসরি প্রবে Specifically, over a set of candidate templates, we choose the template that maximizes the mutual information between the input and the corresponding model output.  ৮ টি ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে ৭টি বিভিন্ন এনএলপি কাজের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে যখন একটি মন্দির বেশী পার্থক্য তথ্য থাকে, তখন সবচেয়ে বড় মডেলে, আমাদের পদ্ধতি দ্বারা বেছে নেওয়া ব্যবস্থাগুলোর মধ্যে ৯০\\শতাংশ রাস্তা থেকে সর্বোচ্চ দ্রুত সঠিক পরিস্থিতির দ্রুত স', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները ստանում են նշանակալի լեզվաբանական և փաստական գիտելիքներ այն հսկայական կառուցվածքից, որի վրա նրանք պատրաստված են, և արագ ճարտարագիտությունը փորձում է հարմարեցնել այս մոդելները որոշակի առաջադրանքների հետ: Դժբախտաբար, գոյություն ունեցող արագ ճարտարագիտական մեթոդները պահանջում են նշանակալի քանակությամբ պիտակուցված տվյալներ, մոդելի պարամետրերի հասանելիություն կամ երկուսն էլ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր մեթոդ \\Texit{առանց պիտակ օրինակների} և \\Texit{առանց ուղղակի մոդելի հասանելիության ընտրելու համար: Մասնավորապես, թեկնածու մոդելների մի շարքում մենք ընտրում ենք մոդելը, որը մեծացնում է փոխադարձ տեղեկատվությունը ներմուծի և համապատասխանի մոդելի արտադրության միջև: 8 տվյալների համակարգերի միջոցով, որոնք ներկայացնում են 7 տարբեր ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքներ, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ երբ մոդելը ունի բարձր փոխադարձ տեղեկատվություն, այն նույնպես ունի բարձր ճշգրտություն: On the largest model, selecting prompts with our method gets 90\\% of the way from the average prompt accuracy to the best prompt accuracy and requires no ground truth labels.', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatge pré-entrenats deriven coneixements lingüístics i factuals substancials de la corpora massiva en la qual són entrenats, i l'enginyeria ràpida busca allinjar aquests models a tasques específices. Malauradament, els mètodes d'enginyeria ràpida existents requereixen quantitats significatives de dades etiquetades, accés a paràmetres de model, o ambdós. Introduïm un nou mètode per seleccionar patrons prompt \\textit{sense exemples etiquetats} i \\textit{sense accés directament al model}. Concretament, sobre un conjunt de models candidats, escollim el model que maximitza la informació mutua entre la entrada i la salida correspondent del model. A través de 8 conjunts de dades que representen 7 tasques distintes de NLP, demostram que quan un model té alta informació mútua, també té alta precisió en la tasca. En el model més gran, seleccionar preguntes amb el nostre mètode obté el 90\\% del camí de la mitjana de la precisió ràpida a la millor precisió ràpida i no requereix etiquetes de veritat fonamental.", 'cs': 'Předškolené jazykové modely odvozují značné jazykové a faktické znalosti z masivních korpusů, na nichž jsou trénovány, a rychlé inženýrství se snaží tyto modely sladit s konkrétními úkoly. Bohužel stávající metody rychlého inženýrství vyžadují značné množství označených dat, přístup k parametrům modelu, nebo obojí. Představujeme novou metodu výběru šablon výzvy \\textit{bez označených příkladů} a \\textit{bez přímého přístupu k modelu}. Konkrétně nad sadou kandidátských šablon zvolíme šablonu, která maximalizuje vzájemné informace mezi vstupem a odpovídajícím modelovým výstupem. Napříč osmi datovými sadami představujícími sedm různých úkolů NLP ukazujeme, že když má šablona vysoké vzájemné informace, má také vysokou přesnost úkolu. U největšího modelu získává výběr výzvy pomocí naší metody 90\\% cesty od průměrné přesnosti výzvy k nejlepší přesnosti výzvy a nevyžaduje žádné základní popisky pravdy.', 'et': 'Eelkoolitud keelemudelid saavad suurtest korpustest, millel neid koolitatakse, märkimisväärseid keele- ja faktilisi teadmisi ning kiire inseneritehnoloogia eesmärk on viia need mudelid vastavusse konkreetsete ülesannetega. Kahjuks nõuavad olemasolevad kiired insenerimeetodid märkimisväärset hulka märgistatud andmeid, juurdepääsu mudeli parameetritele või mõlemat. Tutvustame uut meetodit viipmallide valimiseks \\textit{ ilma märgistatud näideteta} ja \\textit{ ilma otsese ligipääsuta mudelile}. Konkreetselt valime kandidaadimallide hulgast malli, mis maksimeerib sisendi ja vastava mudeli väljundi vastastikust teavet. Kaheksas andmekogumis, mis esindavad seitset erinevat NLP ülesannet, näitame, et kui mallil on kõrge vastastikune teave, on sellel ka ülesande täpsus. Suurima mudeli puhul saab meie meetodiga viivituste valimine 90\\% keskmisest viivituse täpsusest parima viivituse täpsuseni ja ei nõua põhiseid tõesemärke.', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut kielimallit saavat huomattavaa kielellistä ja tosiasiallista tietoa massiivisista korpusista, joissa he ovat koulutettuja, ja nopea suunnittelu pyrkii mukauttamaan nämä mallit tiettyihin tehtäviin. Valitettavasti nykyiset pikasuunnittelumenetelmät vaativat merkittäviä määriä merkittyä dataa, pääsyä malliparametreihin tai molempia. Esittelemme uuden tavan valita kehotusmallit \\textit{ ilman merkittyjä esimerkkejä} ja \\textit{ ilman suoraa pääsyä malliin}. Valitsemme ehdokasmallien joukosta mallin, joka maksimoi syötteen ja vastaavan mallin tuotoksen keskinäisen tiedon. Osoitamme, että kun mallissa on korkeat keskinäiset tiedot, se on myös erittäin tarkka tehtävän suhteen. Suurimmassa mallissa kehotusten valitseminen menetelmällämme saa 90\\% matkasta keskimääräisestä kehotustarkkuudesta parhaaseen kehotustarkkuuteen, eikä vaadi pohjatietoja.', 'jv': 'Piro-terus saiki model sing kelas kuwi tindang bantuan karo perusahaan kelas kuwi tindang nggawe barang langgar lan alam kuwi tindang kuwi bantuan ingkang dipunahan kanggo tukang, lan ujaran injering sumusulah kanggo nggawe model iki sak bantuan nggawe aksi iki. item-set text string" in "context_BAR_stringLink section text-tool-action', 'sk': 'Vnaprej usposobljeni jezikovni modeli pridobivajo znatno jezikovno in dejansko znanje iz množičnih korpusov, na katerih so usposobljeni, hitro inženirstvo pa želi te modele uskladiti s posebnimi nalogami. Žal obstoječe hitre inženirske metode zahtevajo znatne količine označenih podatkov, dostop do parametrov modela ali oboje. Predstavljamo novo metodo za izbiro predlog pozivov \\textit{ brez označenih primerov} in \\textit{ brez neposrednega dostopa do modela}. Natančneje, nad naborom kandidatnih predlog izberemo predlogo, ki maksimira medsebojne informacije med vnosom in ustreznim izhodom modela. V osmih naborih podatkov, ki predstavljajo 7 različnih opravil NLP, pokažemo, da ima predloga, kadar ima visoke medsebojne informacije, visoko natančnost opravila. Pri največjem modelu izbira pozivov z našo metodo doseže 90\\% poti od povprečne natančnosti pozivov do najboljše natančnosti pozivov in ne zahteva oznak resnice.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפה מאומנים מראש משיגים ידע שפתי ומעובד משמעותי מהגופורה המסיבית בה הם מאומנים, וההנדסה המהירה מנסה לארגן את הדוגמנים האלה למשימות מסוימות. למרבה הצער, שיטות הנדסה המהירות קיימות דורשות כמויות משמעותיות של נתונים מסוימים, גישה לפרמטרים מודל, או שניהם. אנחנו מציגים שיטה חדשה לבחירה של דוגמאות \\ textit {ללא דוגמאות מסומנות} ו \\ textit {ללא גישה ישירה למודל}. במיוחד, מעל קבוצה של מועמדים מועמדים, אנחנו בוחרים את המצב שמקסימום את המידע המשותף בין הכניסה והיציאה המודל המתאימה. מעבר ל-8 קבוצות נתונים מייצגים 7 משימות NLP נפרדות, אנחנו מראים שכאשר למדגם יש מידע משותף גבוה, יש לו גם מדויקה גבוהה על המשימה. במודל הגדול ביותר, לבחור נקודות עם השיטה שלנו מקבל 90% מהדרך מהמדויקת הממוצעת המהירה למדיקת המהירה הטובה ביותר ולא דורש שום תוויות אמת קרקעית.', 'ha': "Modalin harshe na fara-haƙƙin ta zo daga makampuni mai girma da aka sanar da su, kuma masu aikin muhimmanci yana son ya sami misalin su zuwa aikin ƙayyade. Babu'am, metoden Enginein da ake iya gaba yana ƙayyade yawan mutane na da aka rubũta, da amfani da parametre ɗin ayuka, ko duk biyu. Tuna ƙuyya da wata hanyo na sabo da za'a zãɓi buƙatan kayan aiki na buƙata /text tit Ka ƙayyade, kan wani sali na kanana masu haɗi, za mu zãɓi salon da za'a faɗa ɗa agare guda tsakanin shiga da shirin ayuka mai daidaita. Ko cikin tsarin da ke wakin aikin NLP 7 taƙa it a, Munã nuna cewa idan wata masallãci na da tsakanin tsakanin, yana da tsari mai girma a kan aikin. Ga motsi mafi girma, za'a zãɓi farao da metoden mu na motsa 90/% na hanya daga tsakanin sauri zuwa taƙaitacce mafi kyãwo, kuma bã ya buƙata alama na gaske.", 'bo': 'Pre-trained language models derive substantial linguistic and factual knowledge from the massive corpora on which they are trained, and prompt engineering seeks to align these models to specific tasks. Unfortunately, existing prompt engineering methods require significant amounts of labeled data, access to model parameters, or both. We introduce a new method for selecting prompt templates \\textit{without labeled examples} and \\textit{without direct access to the model}. དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་ངེད་ཚོའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྟོན་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས Across 8 datasets representing 7 distinct NLP tasks, we show that when a template has high mutual information, it also has high accuracy on the task. In the largest model, selecting prompts with our method gets 90\\% of the way from the average prompt accuracy to the best prompt accuracy and requires no ground truth labels.'}
{'en': 'The Moral Integrity Corpus A Benchmark for Ethical Dialogue Systems', 'ar': 'توسيع النماذج المحددة مسبقًا إلى آلاف اللغات الأخرى عبر التكيف المستند إلى المعجم', 'pt': 'Expansão de modelos pré-treinados para milhares de idiomas por meio da adaptação baseada em léxico', 'fr': "Extension des modèles préentraînés à des milliers de langues supplémentaires grâce à l'adaptation basée sur un lexique", 'es': 'Expansión de modelos preentrenados a miles de idiomas más mediante la adaptación basada en léxico', 'ja': 'Lexiconベースの適応を通じて、事前に訓練されたモデルを数千の言語に拡張する', 'zh': '因词典改编将预练模形至数千种语言', 'ru': 'Расширение предварительно подготовленных моделей до тысяч языков за счет адаптации на основе лексикона', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकॉन-आधारित अनुकूलन के माध्यम से हजारों और भाषाओं के लिए Pretrained मॉडल का विस्तार', 'ga': 'Múnlaí Réamhthraenáilte a Mhéadú chuig na Mílte Teanga Eile trí Oiriúnú Bunaithe ar Fhoclóir', 'el': 'Επέκταση των προκαθορισμένων μοντέλων σε χιλιάδες περισσότερες γλώσσες μέσω προσαρμογής με βάση το λεξικό', 'it': "Espandere i modelli pretrained a migliaia di altre lingue tramite l'adattamento basato su Lexicon", 'kk': 'Name', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'Проширување на претренираните модели на илјадници јазици преку адаптација базирана на лексикони', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d വഴിയില്\u200d ആയിരക്കണക്കിന് കൂടുതല്\u200d ഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് മോഡേലുകള', 'ms': 'Memperbesarkan Model Terlatih ke Ribuan Bahasa Lebih Melalui Penyesuaian Berasas-Lexicon', 'mn': 'Хэдэн мянга мянган хэл руу Pretrained Models-г Lexicon-based Adaptation аргаар нэмэгдүүлж', 'hu': 'Az előkészített modellek bővítése több ezer nyelvre Lexikon alapú adaptációval', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Rozszerzanie wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli na tysiące więcej języków dzięki adaptacji opartej na leksykonie', 'mt': 'L-espansjoni ta’ mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel għal eluf ta’ Lingwi Aktar permezz ta’ Adattament ibbażat fuq il-Lexicon', 'ro': 'Extinderea modelelor pretrainate la mii de limbi prin adaptare bazată pe Lexicon', 'sr': 'Proširenje pretreniranih modela na hiljade jezika preko leksičke adaptacije', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Utvidga förutbestämda modeller till tusentals fler språk via Lexikonbaserad anpassning', 'so': 'Waxbarashada modellada horumarinta ah ee kumanyaal luuqadood oo dheeraad ah ku qoran Adaptation-based Lexicon', 'ta': 'முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை லெக்சிக்சன் அடிப்படையில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட மொழிகளுக்கு ஆயிரக்கணக்கான மொழிகளு', 'ur': 'Name', 'lt': 'Expanding Pretrained Models to Thousands More Languages via Lexicon-based Adaptation', 'uz': 'Expanding Pretrained Models to Thousands More Languages via Lexicon-based Adaptation', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Разширяване на предварително обучените модели до хиляди други езици чрез адаптация, базирана на лексикони', 'da': 'Udvidelse af forudgående modeller til tusindvis af flere sprog via Lexicon-baseret tilpasning', 'nl': 'Voorgetrainde modellen uitbreiden naar duizenden talen via Lexicon-gebaseerde aanpassing', 'hr': 'Proširenje pristojnih modela na tisuće jezika preko leksičke adaptacije', 'fa': 'گسترش مدل\u200cهای پرتین به هزاران زبان بیشتری از طریق تغییرات بر اساس لکسیکون', 'id': 'Memperbesarkan Model Terlatih ke Ribuan Bahasa Lebih Melalui Adaptasi Berdasarkan Lexicon', 'de': 'Erweiterung vortrainierter Modelle auf Tausende weitere Sprachen durch Lexikonbasierte Anpassung', 'ko': '사전 기반의 개편을 통해 예비 훈련 모델을 수천 개의 언어로 확장하다', 'sw': 'Kueneza Modeli zilizojifunza kwa maelfu ya lugha zaidi kupitia Tamko la Kilexico', 'tr': 'Müňlerçe Diller Leksik tabanly Adjustasy görnöşi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Zgjerimi i modeleve të stërvitura për mijra gjuhë më shumë nëpërmjet adaptimit me bazë në leksikon', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկոնի հիմնված հարմարեցման միջոցով ավելի շատ լեզուներ ընդլայնելը', 'bs': 'Proširenje pretreniranih modela na tisuće jezika preko leksičke adaptacije', 'bn': 'লেক্সিকোর ভিত্তিক অ্যাডাপ্টেশনের মাধ্যমে হাজার হাজার ভাষায় প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল বিস্তারিত করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Rozšíření předcvičených modelů na tisíce jazyků prostřednictvím adaptace založené na Lexikonu', 'ca': "Expandir models pré-entrenats a milers de llengües mitjançant l'adaptació basada en Lexicons", 'et': 'Eeltreenitud mudelite laiendamine tuhandetele keeltele leksikonipõhise kohandamise kaudu', 'az': '䱥硩捯渭扡獥搠䅤慰瑡瑩潮⁶慳楴즙獩泉餠浩汹潮污牣愠摩汬즙狉餠偲整牡楮敤⁍潤敬猠来湩얟泉饮摩物爊', 'fi': 'Valmennettujen mallien laajentaminen tuhansille eri kielille Lexicon-pohjaisen mukautuksen avulla', 'jv': 'Expanding Presspied Modes to Tusands', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הרחיבה של מודלים מתאמנים לפני אלפי שפות נוספות באמצעות התאמה מבוססת לקסיקון', 'sk': 'Razširitev predtreniranih modelov na tisoče več jezikov s prilagajanjem na osnovi Lexicona', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལུས་པོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྟོང་སའི་སྐད་ཡིག་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Conversational agents have come increasingly closer to human competence in open domain dialogue settings however such models can reflect insensitive hurtful or entirely incoherent viewpoints that erode a user’s trust in the moral integrity of the system Moral deviations are difficult to mitigate because moral judgments are not universal and there may be multiple competing judgments that apply to a situation simultaneously In this work we introduce a new resource not to authoritatively resolve moral ambiguities but instead to facilitate systematic understanding of the intuitions values and moral judgments reflected in the utterances of dialogue systems The Moral Integrity Corpus MIC is such a resource which captures the moral assumptions of 38k prompt reply pairs using 99k distinct Rules of Thumb RoTs Each RoT reflects a particular moral conviction that can explain why a chatbot’s reply may appear acceptable or problematic We further organize RoTs with a set of moral and social attributes and benchmark performance for attribute classification Most importantly we show that current neural language models can automatically generate new RoTs that reasonably describe previously unseen interactions but they still struggle with certain scenarios Our findings suggest that MIC will be a useful resource for understanding and language models implicit moral assumptions and flexibly benchmarking the integrity of conversational agents To download the data see https://github.com/GT-SALT/mic', 'ar': 'يعتمد أداء النماذج متعددة اللغات التي تم اختبارها مسبقًا بشكل كبير على توفر نص أحادي اللغة أو متوازي موجود في اللغة الهدف. وبالتالي ، لا يمكن أن تستفيد غالبية لغات العالم من التقدم الأخير في معالجة اللغات الطبيعية نظرًا لعدم توفر بيانات نصية أو تحتوي على بيانات نصية محدودة. لتوسيع إمكانيات استخدام تقنية البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في هذه اللغات منخفضة التمثيل ، نقوم بدراسة منهجية للاستراتيجيات التي تخفف الاعتماد على موارد اللغة التقليدية من خلال استخدام المعاجم ثنائية اللغة ، وهي مورد بديل بتغطية لغوية أفضل بكثير. نقوم بتحليل الاستراتيجيات المختلفة لتجميع البيانات النصية أو المصنفة باستخدام المعاجم ، وكيف يمكن دمج هذه البيانات مع نص أحادي اللغة أو نص متوازي عند توفرها. بالنسبة إلى 19 لغة ممثلة تمثيلاً ناقصًا في 3 مهام ، تؤدي أساليبنا إلى تحسينات متسقة تصل إلى 5 و 15 نقطة مع وبدون نص أحادي اللغة إضافي على التوالي. بشكل عام ، توضح دراستنا كيف يمكن تكييف أساليب البرمجة اللغوية العصبية مع آلاف اللغات الأخرى التي لا تخدمها التكنولوجيا الحالية.', 'fr': "Les performances des modèles préentraînés multilingues dépendent fortement de la disponibilité de texte monolingue ou parallèle présent dans une langue cible. Ainsi, la majorité des langues du monde ne peuvent pas bénéficier des récents progrès en matière de PNL car elles ne possèdent pas ou peu de données textuelles. Pour élargir les possibilités d'utilisation de la technologie de la PNL dans ces langues sous-représentées, nous étudions systématiquement des stratégies qui assouplissent la dépendance aux ressources linguistiques conventionnelles grâce à l'utilisation de lexiques bilingues, une ressource alternative offrant une couverture linguistique bien meilleure. Nous analysons différentes stratégies pour synthétiser des données textuelles ou étiquetées à l'aide de lexiques, et comment ces données peuvent être combinées avec du texte monolingue ou parallèle, le cas échéant. Pour 19 langues sous-représentées dans 3 tâches, nos méthodes conduisent à des améliorations constantes allant jusqu'à 5 et 15 points avec et sans texte monolingue supplémentaire respectivement. Dans l'ensemble, notre étude met en évidence comment les méthodes de PNL peuvent être adaptées à des milliers de langues supplémentaires mal desservies par la technologie actuelle.", 'pt': 'O desempenho de modelos pré-treinados multilíngues depende muito da disponibilidade de texto monolíngue ou paralelo presente em um idioma de destino. Assim, a maioria dos idiomas do mundo não pode se beneficiar do progresso recente da PNL, pois não possuem dados textuais ou são limitados. Para expandir as possibilidades de uso da tecnologia da PNL nessas línguas sub-representadas, estudamos sistematicamente estratégias que relaxam a dependência de recursos linguísticos convencionais por meio do uso de léxicos bilíngues, um recurso alternativo com cobertura linguística muito melhor. Analisamos diferentes estratégias para sintetizar dados textuais ou rotulados usando léxicos e como esses dados podem ser combinados com texto monolíngue ou paralelo quando disponível. Para 19 idiomas sub-representados em 3 tarefas, nossos métodos levam a melhorias consistentes de até 5 e 15 pontos com e sem texto monolíngue extra, respectivamente. No geral, nosso estudo destaca como os métodos de PNL podem ser adaptados a milhares de outras linguagens que não são atendidas pela tecnologia atual.', 'es': 'El rendimiento de los modelos multilingües preentrenados depende en gran medida de la disponibilidad de texto monolingüe o paralelo presente en un idioma de destino. Por lo tanto, la mayoría de los idiomas del mundo no pueden beneficiarse del progreso reciente en la PNL, ya que no tienen datos textuales o tienen datos textuales limitados. Para ampliar las posibilidades de utilizar la tecnología de PNL en estos idiomas poco representados, estudiamos sistemáticamente estrategias que relajan la dependencia de los recursos lingüísticos convencionales mediante el uso de léxicos bilingües, un recurso alternativo con una cobertura lingüística mucho mejor. Analizamos diferentes estrategias para sintetizar datos textuales o etiquetados mediante lexicones, y cómo estos datos se pueden combinar con texto monolingüe o paralelo cuando estén disponibles. Para 19 idiomas infrarrepresentados en 3 tareas, nuestros métodos conducen a mejoras consistentes de hasta 5 y 15 puntos con y sin texto monolingüe adicional, respectivamente. En general, nuestro estudio destaca cómo los métodos de PNL se pueden adaptar a miles de idiomas más que están desatendidos por la tecnología actual.', 'ja': '多言語の事前訓練されたモデルのパフォーマンスは、ターゲット言語に存在する単語または並列テキストの可用性に大きく依存します。 したがって、世界の言語の大部分は、テキストデータがないか、または制限されているため、NLPの最近の進歩から恩恵を受けることができない。 これらの言語でNLPテクノロジーを使用する可能性を拡大するために、私たちはバイリンガル辞書の使用を通じて従来の言語リソースへの依存を緩和する戦略を体系的に研究しています。バイリンガル辞書は、言語カバレッジをはるかに向上させた代替リソースです。 私たちは、テキストまたはラベル付けされたデータを辞書を使用して合成するためのさまざまな戦略を分析し、利用可能な場合、このデータを単語または並列テキストと組み合わせる方法を分析します。\xa03つのタスクにわたる19の言語の表現不足について、当社の方法は、それぞれ追加の単一言語テキストの有無にかかわらず、最大5ポイントと15ポイントの一貫した改善につながります。  全体的に、私たちの研究は、NLPメソッドが現在のテクノロジーによってサービスが十分に提供されていない数千以上の言語にどのように適応できるかを強調しています。', 'zh': '多言预练模形之性,高依于言单语或并行文本之可用性。 是故世多言无以益NLP最新进展,无本数有限也。 以广代表性不足之言用NLP术之可用,吾系统地究用双语词典以弛旧语之资,双语词典善言覆盖率之代资也。 论用词典合文标数之异策,与可用之时,与单语并合。\xa03 一事 19 种代表性不足之言,吾法用与不用额外单语文本者,各持更进至 5 分 15 。  总体而言者,治之也NLP术之不足者,数千言也。', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी प्रीट्रेन्ड मॉडल का प्रदर्शन एक लक्ष्य भाषा में मौजूद मोनोलिंगुअल या समानांतर पाठ की उपलब्धता पर अत्यधिक निर्भर करता है। इस प्रकार, दुनिया की अधिकांश भाषाओं को एनएलपी में हाल की प्रगति से लाभ नहीं हो सकता है क्योंकि उनके पास कोई या सीमित पाठ्य डेटा नहीं है। इन कम प्रतिनिधित्व वाली भाषाओं में एनएलपी प्रौद्योगिकी का उपयोग करने की संभावनाओं का विस्तार करने के लिए, हम व्यवस्थित रूप से उन रणनीतियों का अध्ययन करते हैं जो द्विभाषी शब्दकोशों के उपयोग के माध्यम से पारंपरिक भाषा संसाधनों पर निर्भरता को आराम देते हैं, जो बहुत बेहतर भाषा कवरेज के साथ एक वैकल्पिक संसाधन है। हम लेक्सिकॉन का उपयोग करके टेक्स्ट या लेबल किए गए डेटा को संश्लेषित करने के लिए विभिन्न रणनीतियों का विश्लेषण करते हैं, और उपलब्ध होने पर इस डेटा को मोनोलिंगुअल या समानांतर पाठ के साथ कैसे जोड़ा जा सकता है।\xa03 कार्यों में 19 कम प्रतिनिधित्व वाली भाषाओं के लिए, हमारे तरीके क्रमशः अतिरिक्त मोनोलिंगुअल पाठ के साथ और बिना 5 और 15 अंकों तक के लगातार सुधार की ओर ले जाते हैं।  कुल मिलाकर, हमारा अध्ययन इस बात पर प्रकाश डालता है कि एनएलपी विधियों को हजारों और भाषाओं के लिए कैसे अनुकूलित किया जा सकता है जो वर्तमान तकनीक द्वारा कम सेवा प्रदान की जाती हैं।', 'ru': 'Эффективность многоязычных предварительно подготовленных моделей в значительной степени зависит от наличия одноязычного или параллельного текста, имеющегося на целевом языке. Таким образом, большинство языков мира не могут извлечь выгоду из недавнего прогресса\xa0в NLP, поскольку они не имеют или ограничены текстовыми данными. Чтобы расширить возможности использования технологии NLP в этих недопредставленных языках, мы\xa0систематически изучаем стратегии, которые ослабляют зависимость от традиционных языковых ресурсов за счет использования двуязычных лексиконов, альтернативного ресурса с гораздо лучшим языковым охватом. Мы анализируем различные стратегии синтеза текстовых или маркированных данных с помощью лексиконов, и как эти данные могут быть объединены с одноязычным или параллельным текстом, когда это доступно.\xa0Для 19 недопредставленных языков в 3 задачах наши методы приводят к постоянным улучшениям до 5 и 15 баллов с дополнительным одноязычным текстом и без него соответственно.  В целом, наше исследование показывает, как методы NLP могут быть адаптированы к тысячам других языков, которые недостаточно обслуживаются современной технологией.', 'ga': 'Braitheann feidhmiú samhlacha ilteangacha réamhoilte go mór ar théacs aonteangach nó comhthreomhar a bheith ar fáil i sprioctheanga. Mar sin, ní féidir le formhór theangacha an domhain leas a bhaint as an dul chun cinn le déanaí in NLP toisc nach bhfuil aon sonraí téacsúla acu nó nach bhfuil ach sonraí teoranta acu. Chun na féidearthachtaí a bhaineann le teicneolaíocht NLP a úsáid sna teangacha tearc-ionadaithe seo a mhéadú, déanaimid staidéar córasach ar straitéisí a mhaolaíonn an spleáchas ar ghnáth-acmhainní teanga trí úsáid a bhaint as foclóirí dátheangacha, acmhainn mhalartach a bhfuil clúdach teanga i bhfad níos fearr aici. Déanaimid anailís ar straitéisí éagsúla chun sonraí téacsúla nó lipéadaithe a shintéisiú ag baint úsáide as foclóirí, agus conas is féidir na sonraí seo a chomhcheangal le téacs aonteangach nó comhthreomhar nuair atá siad ar fáil. I gcás 19 dteanga faoi ghannionadaíocht thar 3 thasc, tagann feabhsuithe comhsheasmhacha suas le 5 agus 15 phointe as ár modhanna le téacs aonteangach breise agus gan téacs breise faoi seach. Tríd is tríd, léiríonn ár staidéar conas is féidir modhanna NLP a oiriúnú do na mílte teangacha eile nach bhfreastalaíonn go leor orthu ag an teicneolaíocht reatha.', 'el': 'Η απόδοση των πολύγλωσσων προ-εκπαιδευμένων μοντέλων εξαρτάται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από τη διαθεσιμότητα μονογλωσσικού ή παράλληλου κειμένου που υπάρχει σε μια γλώσσα-στόχο. Έτσι, η πλειονότητα των γλωσσών του κόσμου δεν μπορεί να επωφεληθεί από την πρόσφατη πρόοδο στο NLP, καθώς δεν έχουν ούτε περιορισμένα κειμενικά δεδομένα. Για να διευρύνουμε τις δυνατότητες χρήσης της τεχνολογίας σε αυτές τις υποεκπροσωπούμενες γλώσσες, μελετούμε συστηματικά στρατηγικές που χαλαρώνουν την εξάρτηση από συμβατικούς γλωσσικούς πόρους μέσω της χρήσης δίγλωσσων λεξικών, ενός εναλλακτικού πόρου με πολύ καλύτερη γλωσσική κάλυψη. Αναλύουμε διαφορετικές στρατηγικές για τη σύνθεση κειμένων ή ετικετών δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας λεξικά και πώς αυτά τα δεδομένα μπορούν να συνδυαστούν με μονογλωσσικό ή παράλληλο κείμενο όταν είναι διαθέσιμα. Για τις 19 υποεκπροσωπούμενες γλώσσες σε τρεις εργασίες, οι μέθοδοι μας οδηγούν σε συνεπείς βελτιώσεις έως 5 και 15 σημείων με και χωρίς επιπλέον μονόγλωσσο κείμενο αντίστοιχα. Συνολικά, η μελέτη μας επισημαίνει πώς οι μέθοδοι μπορούν να προσαρμοστούν σε χιλιάδες άλλες γλώσσες που δεν εξυπηρετούνται από την τρέχουσα τεχνολογία.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური მოდელების გამოსახულება მნიშვნელოვანია მონოლენგური ან პარალელური ტექსტის ხელსახულებაზე. ამიტომ, მსოფლიოს ენების უფრო მეტი შეუძლებელია NLP წინახალი პროგრესიდან გამოიყენება, რადგან ისინი არ აქვს ან განზომილებული ტექსტულ მონაცე NLP ტექნოლოგიის გამოყენების შესაძლებლობების გაფართვა ამ აკეთებული ენაში, ჩვენ სისტემატიკურად სტრატიგიურად ვისწავლოთ სტრატიგიები, რომლებიც კონგენციონალური ენათის რესურსების შესაძლებლობად, ორიენგურ ჩვენ განსხვავებული სტრატეგიების ანალიზაცია ტექსტულ ან ლაკიკონის გამოყენებაში მონაცემები და როგორ ეს მონაცემები მონოლენგური ან პარალელი ტექსტის შესაძლებელად შე 19 უფრო გამოსახულებული ენებისთვის სამი დავალების განმავლობაში, ჩვენი მეტოვები შეუძლებელია 5 და 15 წერტილების შესახულებელი მეტოვებით, რომელიც მეტად მონოლენგური ტექსტის გარეშე ჩვენი სწავლის განსხვავება, როგორ NLP მეტოვები შეუძლიათ აეპორტირება მიმდინარე ტექნოლოგიებით ახალგაზრდა ახალგაზრდებით ახალგაზრდებით.', 'it': "Le prestazioni dei modelli multilingue pre-addestrati dipendono fortemente dalla disponibilità di testi monolingue o paralleli presenti in una lingua di destinazione. Pertanto, la maggior parte delle lingue del mondo non può beneficiare dei recenti progressi nel PNL in quanto non dispongono di dati testuali o limitati. Per ampliare le possibilità di utilizzare la tecnologia NLP in queste lingue sottorappresentate, studiamo sistematicamente strategie che rilassano la dipendenza dalle risorse linguistiche convenzionali attraverso l'uso di lessici bilingui, una risorsa alternativa con una copertura linguistica molto migliore. Analizziamo diverse strategie per sintetizzare dati testuali o etichettati utilizzando lessici, e come questi dati possono essere combinati con testo monolingue o parallelo quando disponibili. Per 19 lingue sottorappresentate in 3 attività, i nostri metodi portano a miglioramenti costanti fino a 5 e 15 punti con e senza testo monolingue supplementare rispettivamente. Nel complesso, il nostro studio evidenzia come i metodi NLP possano essere adattati a migliaia di altre lingue che sono sottoservite dalla tecnologia attuale.", 'lt': "Daugiakalbių išankstinio mokymo modelių veiksmingumas labai priklauso nuo to, ar yra vienakalbių arba lygiagrečių tekstų tikslinėje kalboje. Thus, the majority of the world's languages cannot benefit from recent progress in NLP as they have no or limited textual data.  To expand possibilities of using NLP technology in these under-represented languages, we systematically study strategies that relax the reliance on conventional language resources through the use of bilingual lexicons, an alternative resource with much better language coverage.  Analizuojame skirtingas tekstinių ar pažymėtų duomenų sintezės strategijas naudojant leksikonus ir kaip šie duomenys gali būti derinami su vienkalbiniu arba lygiagrečiu tekstu, jei yra. 19 nepakankamai atstovaujamų kalbų taikant tris užduotis, taikant mūsų metodus nuosekliai patobulinami atitinkamai iki 5 ir 15 punktų su papildomu vienakalbiniu tekstu ir be jo. Apskritai mūsų tyrime pabrėžiama, kaip NLP metodai gali būti pritaikyti tūkstančiams daugiau kalbų, kurioms dabartinės technologijos nepakankamai naudojamos.", 'hu': 'A többnyelvű előképzett modellek teljesítménye nagymértékben függ a célnyelven jelen lévő egynyelvű vagy párhuzamos szöveg elérhetőségétől. A világ nyelveinek többsége tehát nem használhatja a nemzeti politika terén történt közelmúltbeli fejlődést, mivel nincs vagy korlátozott szöveges adat. Annak érdekében, hogy bővítsük az NLP technológia lehetőségeit ezekben az alulreprezentált nyelvekben, rendszeresen tanulmányozzuk azokat a stratégiákat, amelyek a hagyományos nyelvi erőforrásokra való támaszkodást enyhítik a kétnyelvű lexikonok használatával, amelyek sokkal jobb nyelvi lefedettséggel rendelkező alternatív erőforrás. Elemzünk különböző stratégiákat a szöveges vagy címkézett adatok szintetizálására lexikonok segítségével, és hogyan lehet ezek az adatok kombinálni egynyelvű vagy párhuzamos szöveggel, ha rendelkezésre állnak. 19 alulreprezentált nyelv esetében 3 feladat során, módszereink akár 5, illetve 15 pontos következetes fejlesztést eredményeznek extra egynyelvű szöveggel, illetve anélkül. Tanulmányunk összességében kiemeli, hogy az NLP módszerek hogyan alkalmazhatók több ezer olyan nyelvre, amelyeket a jelenlegi technológia nem szolgál ki.', 'mk': "Преводот на мултијазичните предобучени модели е високо зависен од достапноста на монојазичен или паралелен текст присутен на јазик на целта. Thus, the majority of the world's languages cannot benefit from recent progress in NLP as they have no or limited textual data.  За да ги прошириме можностите за употреба на технологијата на НЛП во овие недопретставени јазици, систематски студираме стратегии кои ја олеснуваат зависноста од конвенционалните јазички ресурси преку употреба на двојјазични лексикони, алтернативен ресурс со многу подобро јази Ние анализираме различни стратегии за синтезирање текстуални или означени податоци користејќи лексикони, и како овие податоци можат да се комбинираат со монојазичен или паралелен текст кога се достапни. За 19 недопретставени јазици во три задачи, нашите методи водат до константни подобрувања од 5 и 15 поени, односно со и без екстра монојазичен текст. Вкупно, нашата студија истакнува како методите на НЛП може да се адаптираат на илјадници јазици кои се недостасуваат од сегашната технологија.", 'ms': 'Performasi model yang dilatih-dilatih berbilang bahasa sangat bergantung pada kebebasan teks monobahasa atau selari yang ada dalam bahasa sasaran. Oleh itu, kebanyakan bahasa dunia tidak dapat mengambil manfaat dari kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam NLP kerana mereka tiada data teks atau data teks terbatas. Untuk mengembangkan kemungkinan menggunakan teknologi NLP dalam bahasa-bahasa yang kurang mewakili ini, kami secara sistematik mempelajari strategi yang meringankan bergantung pada sumber bahasa konvensional melalui menggunakan leksikon dua bahasa, sumber alternatif dengan perlindungan bahasa yang jauh lebih baik. Kami menganalisis strategi berbeza untuk sintesis data teks atau labeled menggunakan leksikon, dan bagaimana data ini boleh digabung dengan teks monobahasa atau selari bila tersedia. Untuk 19 bahasa dibawah-mewakili melalui 3 tugas, kaedah kami membawa kepada peningkatan konsisten sehingga 5 dan 15 titik dengan dan tanpa teks monobahasa tambahan secara berdasarkan. Secara keseluruhan, kajian kami menyatakan bagaimana kaedah NLP boleh disesuaikan kepada ribuan bahasa yang dibayar oleh teknologi semasa.', 'kk': 'Көптеген тілдердің өзгертілген үлгілерін бірнеше тілде болатын немесе параллелі мәтін қолдануға тәуелді. Бұл үшін әлемдегі тілдердің көпшілігі NLP жаңа бағдарламасынан шығарылмайды, өйткені олардың мәтіндік деректері жоқ немесе шектелмейді. NLP технологиясын осы тілдерде қолдану мүмкіндігін кеңейту үшін, біз жүйелік түрде әдеттегі тіл ресурстарына қатынасыз көмектесетін стратегияларды зерттейміз. Екі тіл лексикондарын қолдану арқылы, көп жақсы тіл мәл Біз текстуалды не жарлық деректерді лексиканды қолдану үшін әртүрлі стратегияларды анализ және бұл деректерді монолингі не параллелі мәтінмен қалай біріктіруге болады. Біздің әдістеріміз 3 тапсырмалардың ішінде 19 тілдерді бағыттау үшін 5 мен 15 нүктерге дейінгі жақсартылып, қосымша бірнеше тілді мәтін жоқ болмайды. Жалпы, біздің зерттеулеріміз NLP әдістерін назардағы технологиялардың тәжірибесі арқылы мыңдаған тілдерге қалай адаптау мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷയില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാണ് പല ഭാഷകളുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനം. അതുകൊണ്ട്, ലോകത്തിലെ ഏറിയ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d പെരുപേരും NLP-ലെ അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഉപകരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല, അവര്\u200d ഈ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രതിനിധിയില്ലാത്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d NLP സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള സാധ്യതകള്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നതിന് നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വാധാരണമായി പഠിക്കു ലെക്സിക്കോണുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടെക്സ്ട്ട്ടുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത ക്രമങ്ങള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാനോ ലേബല്\u200d ചെയ്ത വിവരങ്ങളോ നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക് മൂന്നു ജോലികളിലൂടെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കായി 19 ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക്, നമ്മുടെ രീതികള്\u200d അഞ്ചും 15 പോയിന്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുന്\u200dഗണന മാര്\u200d എല്ലായിടത്തും നമ്മുടെ പഠനം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു, നിലവിലുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂ', 'mt': 'Il-prestazzjoni ta’ mudelli multilingwi mħarrġa minn qabel tiddependi ħafna mid-disponibbiltà ta’ test monolingwi jew parallel preżenti f’lingwa fil-mira. Għalhekk, il-maġġoranza tal-lingwi tad-dinja ma jistgħux jibbenefikaw mill-progress reċenti fil-NLP peress li m’għandhomx dejta testwali jew huma limitati. Biex jespandu l-possibbiltajiet tal-użu tat-teknoloġija NLP f’dawn il-lingwi li mhumiex rappreżentati biżżejjed, nistudjaw b’mod sistematiku strateġiji li jirrilaxxaw id-dipendenza fuq ir-riżorsi tal-lingwi konvenzjonali permezz tal-użu ta’ lexicons billingwi, riżorsa alternattiva b’kopertura tal-lingwi ħafna aħjar. Aħna nianalizzaw strateġiji differenti biex ninsintetizzaw dejta testwali jew ittikkettata bl-użu ta’ lexicons, u kif din id-dejta tista’ tiġi kkombinata ma’ test monolingwi jew parallel meta disponibbli. Għal 19-il lingwa sottorappreżentata fi tliet kompiti, il-metodi tagħna jwasslu għal titjib konsistenti sa 5 u 15-il punt bi u mingħajr test monolingwi addizzjonali rispettivament. Overall, our study highlights how NLP methods can be adapted to thousands more languages that are under-served by current technology.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл дээр суурилсан загварын үйл ажиллагаа нь нэг хэл эсвэл параллель хэл дээр байгаа текст дээр маш их хамааралтай. Иймээс дэлхийн ихэнх хэл нь NLP-ийн саяхан хөгжлийн хөгжлийг ашиглаж чадахгүй болон хязгаарлагдмал мэдээллээс ашиглаж чадахгүй. NLP технологийг эдгээр төвөгтэй хэлд ашиглах боломжуудыг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд бид систематикийн судалгааны стратегийг хоёр хэл хэлний хэлбэрүүдийг ашиглаж, илүү сайн хэлний мэдээллийг ашиглах боломжтой боломжтой болгодог. Бид өөр өөр стратегийг Лексикон ашиглаж, мөн өгөгдлийг нэг хэл, параллел текстэй холбогдох боломжтой шинжилгээ хийдэг. 3 даалгавар дахь 19 хэлний хувьд бидний арга нь 5, 15 цэгээс хамааран нэмэлт нэг хэлний текст байхгүй байдаг. Бидний судалгааны хичээл нь одоогийн технологи дамжуулагдсан мянга мянган хэл дээр хэрхэн NLP аргыг хэрхэн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой талаар илэрхийлж байна.', 'pl': 'Wydajność wielojęzycznych modeli wstępnie trenowanych zależy w dużym stopniu od dostępności jednojęzycznego lub równoległego tekstu obecnego w języku docelowym. W związku z tym większość języków świata nie może skorzystać z ostatnich postępów w NLP, ponieważ nie dysponują one żadnymi lub ograniczonymi danymi tekstowymi. Aby rozszerzyć możliwości wykorzystania technologii NLP w tych niedostatecznie reprezentowanych językach, systematycznie badamy strategie, które złagodzą zależność od konwencjonalnych zasobów językowych poprzez stosowanie dwujęzycznych leksykonów, alternatywnych zasobów o znacznie lepszym zasięgu językowym. Analizujemy różne strategie syntezy danych tekstowych lub etykietowanych przy użyciu leksykonów i jak dane te można łączyć z tekstem jednojęzycznym lub równoległym, jeśli są dostępne. W przypadku 19-tych niedostatecznie reprezentowanych języków w ramach trzech zadań nasze metody prowadzą do konsekwentnych ulepszeń do 5-15 punktów z dodatkowym tekstem jednojęzycznym i bez niego. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, nasze badanie podkreśla, jak metody NLP mogą być dostosowane do tysięcy innych języków, które są niedostatecznie obsługiwane przez obecną technologię.', 'ro': 'Performanța modelelor multilingve pre-instruite depinde în mare măsură de disponibilitatea textului monolingv sau paralel prezent într-o limbă țintă. Astfel, majoritatea limbilor din lume nu pot beneficia de progresele recente în PNL, deoarece nu au date textuale sau limitate. Pentru a extinde posibilitățile de utilizare a tehnologiei PNL în aceste limbi subreprezentate, studiem sistematic strategii care relaxează dependența de resursele lingvistice convenționale prin utilizarea lexicoanelor bilingve, o resursă alternativă cu o acoperire lingvistică mult mai bună. Analizăm diferite strategii de sintetizare a datelor textuale sau etichetate folosind lexicoane și modul în care aceste date pot fi combinate cu text monolingv sau paralel atunci când sunt disponibile. Pentru 19 limbi subreprezentate în 3 sarcini, metodele noastre duc la îmbunătățiri consistente de până la 5 și 15 puncte, cu și fără text monolingv suplimentar. În general, studiul nostru evidențiază modul în care metodele PNL pot fi adaptate la mai multe mii de limbi care sunt subdeservite de tehnologia actuală.', 'no': 'Utviklinga av fleire språksprøvingsmodeller er svært avhengig av tilgjengeligheten av monospråk eller parallelle tekst som finst i eit målspråk. Dei fleste av verdens språka kan derfor ikkje få nyleg framgang i NLP, sidan dei har ingen eller begrenset tekstdata. For å utvida muligheter for å bruka NLP-teknologi i desse underrepresenterte språka, studerer vi systematisk strategier som gjer tilbakekallinga på konvensjonale språk-ressursar gjennom bruk av bilingboksinsk, eit alternativ ressurs med mykje bedre språk-omdekking. Vi analyserer ulike strategiar for å syntisera tekst eller merke data med lexicons, og korleis denne data kan kombinererast med monospråk eller parallell tekst når det er tilgjengeleg. For 19 underrepresenterte språk på 3 oppgåver, måtar våre fører til konsistent forbedringar av opp til 5 og 15 punkt med og utan ekstra monospråk. Overalt er studiet vårt høglys korleis NLP-metodar kan tilpassast til tusenvis meir språk som er under gjeldande teknologi.', 'so': "Dhaqashada tusaalooyin luuqado badan oo lagu soo daayay waxay ku xiran tahay mid aad u badan, waxayna ku xiran tahay helitaanka qoraalka luuqada lagu qorayo ama qoraalka lambarka ah oo ku qoran luqada goalka. Thus, the majority of the world's languages cannot benefit from recent progress in NLP as they have no or limited textual data.  Si aan u sii wadno suurtagalka isticmaalka teknolojiyada NLP ee luuqadahan ka hooseeya, waxaynu si systemic ah u baranaynaa strategiyada ku rida ku tiirsashada rasmiga caadiga ah, isticmaalka leksikaanka labada luuqadood, resource bedel ah oo aad u fiican luqada. Qatarada kala duduwan si aan u dhigno macluumaadka qoraalka ama alaabta lagu qoro, waxaynu u baaraynaa sida macluumaadkan loogu soo bandhigi karo qoraalka muuqashada ama qoraalka isbedela marka ay jiraan. Dhammaan 19 luuqadood oo ka hooseeya shaqo 3 shaqo oo dhan, qaababkayagu wuxuu ku hoggaami karaa horumarinta ugu badnaanta 5 iyo 15 baro, waxayna ku socon yihiin qoraal dheeraad ah oo aan ku jirin. Dhammaan waxbarashadaada waxaa ku qoran sida qaababka NLP looga beddeli karo kumanyaal luuqadood oo kale, kuwaas oo ka hoos adeega teknolojiga hada ah.", 'sv': 'Prestandan av flerspråkiga förkränade modeller beror i hög grad på tillgången på enspråkig eller parallell text på ett målspråk. De flesta av världens språk kan således inte dra nytta av den senaste tidens framsteg inom det nationella handlingsprogrammet, eftersom de saknar eller har begränsade textdata. För att utöka möjligheterna att använda NLP-teknik på dessa underrepresenterade språk studerar vi systematiskt strategier som slappnar av beroende av konventionella språkresurser genom användning av tvåspråkiga lexikon, en alternativ resurs med mycket bättre språktäckning. Vi analyserar olika strategier för att syntetisera textdata eller märkta data med hjälp av lexikon, och hur dessa data kan kombineras med enspråkig eller parallell text när det finns tillgängligt. För 19 underrepresenterade språk över 3 uppgifter leder våra metoder till konsekventa förbättringar på upp till 5 respektive 15 poäng med och utan extra enspråkig text. Sammantaget belyser vår studie hur NLP-metoder kan anpassas till tusentals fler språk som är underbetjänade av nuvarande teknik.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාත්මක විදිහට විශේෂයෙන් ඉලක්ෂ භාෂාවක් වල ඉන්න ඉතින්, ලෝකයේ භාෂාවගේ බොහෝම භාෂාවට NLP වලින් අලුත් ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බෑ ඒ වගේම ඔව NLP තාක්ෂණය භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන භාෂා භාවිතාවට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ අපි වෙනස් ප්\u200dරධානය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ලෙක්සිකන්ස් භාවිතාව සහ ලේබෙල් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, ඒ වගේම මේ දත්ත ප්\u200dරධා වැඩක් තුනක් වලින් 19 වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන භාෂාවට, අපේ විධානය 5 වල 15 වලින් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා වගේම තවත්  සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පුළුවන් විදිහට NLP විදිහට කොහොමද වැඩි භාෂාවට අඩුවෙන් පරික්ෂා කරන්', 'ta': 'பல மொழிகளின் மாதிரியான மாதிரிகளின் செயல்கூறு இலக்கு மொழியில் இருக்கும் மொத்த மொழியில் அல்லது இணைய உரையின் கிடைக்கும் ம எனவே, உலகின் பெரும்பாலான மொழிகளில் அண்மையில் NLP முன்னேற்றத்திலிருந்து பயனுள்ள முடியாது ஏனெனில் அவர்களுக்கு எந்த இந்த கீழே குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட மொழிகளில் NLP தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்த சாத்தியங்களை விரிவாக்க, நாம் அமைப்பாக முறைமையாக ஆராய்ந்து கொள்ளும் திட்டங்கள், சா நாம் மெக்சிக்கன் பயன்படுத்தி வேறு திட்டங்களை ஒத்திசைக்க அல்லது குறிப்பிட்ட தரவை சேர்க்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் இந்த தகவல் எப்படி இருக்கு மூன்று பணிகளுக்கு மேலே குறைந்த மொழிகளுக்கு 19 கீழ் குறைந்த மொழிகளுக்கு, எங்கள் முறைமைகள் முறையாக 5 மற்றும் 15 புள்ளிகளுக்கு ம மொத்தமாக, எங்கள் படிப்பாடு நடப்பு தொழில்நுட்பத்தால் இப்போது சேவைக்கப்பட்டுள்ள ஆயிரக்கணக்கான மொழிகளுக்கு எவ்', 'ur': 'بہت سی زبان پرٹرینڈ موڈل کی عملکرد ایک زبان یا parallel text کے موجود ہونے پر زیادہ اعتماد ہے. اسی طرح، دنیا کی اکثریت زبانیں NLP میں اچھی طرح کی پیشرفت سے فائدہ نہیں پہنچا سکتی، کیونکہ ان کے پاس کوئی یا محدود تفصیل ڈیٹا نہیں ہے. NLP ٹیکنالوجی کی استعمال کرنے کی امکانات کو ان کم کی زبانوں میں پھیلانے کے لئے ہم سیستماتیک طریقے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں جو دو زبانوں کی استعمال کے ذریعہ دوسری زبانوں کی استعمال کے ذریعہ آسانی کرتی ہیں اور بہت اچھی زبانوں کی پورش کے ساتھ ایک الٹی سراسر ہے. ہم مختلف استراتژیکوں کو لکسیکونز کے استعمال سے متصل کرنے کے لئے تفصیل یا لابلیٹ ڈیٹا کا تحلیل کر رہے ہیں، اور یہ ڈیٹا کیسے ایک زبان یا parallel متصل کے ساتھ مل سکتا ہے جب موجود ہوتا ہے۔ 3 دنیا میں 19 زبانوں کے لئے ہمارے طریقے 5 اور 15 نقطے تک سیدھے سیدھے ترکیب دیتے ہیں اور ان کے ساتھ اور بغیر ایک زبان تک متن کے۔ ہمارے تحقیق کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کرتی ہے کہ NLP طریقے کس طرح ہزاروں زبانوں سے اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں جو موجود تکنولوژی کے ذریعے کم خدمت کی جاتی ہیں۔', 'sr': 'Proizvodnja multijezičkih pretkišnih modela veoma zavisi od dostupnosti monojezičkog ili paralelnog teksta prisutnog na ciljnom jeziku. Tako većina jezika sveta ne može koristiti od nedavnog napretka u NLP-u jer nemaju ili ograničene tekstualne podatke. Da bi se proširili mogućnosti koristiti NLP tehnologiju na ovim podpredstavljenim jezicima, sistematski proučavamo strategije koje opuštaju pouzdanost na konvencionalne jezičke resurse kroz korištenje dvojezičkih leksikona, alternativnog resursa sa mnogo boljim jezičkim pokrivanjem. Analiziramo različite strategije za sinteziranje tekstualnih ili etiketiranih podataka koristeći leksikone i kako se podaci mogu kombinirati sa monojezičkim ili paralelnim tekstom kada su dostupni. Za 19 manje predstavljenih jezika preko 3 zadataka, naše metode dovode do konsekventnih poboljšanja do 5 i 15 bodova sa dodatnim monojezičkim tekstom. Naša studija naglašava kako se metode NLP mogu prilagoditi na hiljade više jezika koje su pod uslovom trenutne tehnologije.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik tildagi modellarning bajarishi natijasi target tilda mavjud boʻlgan monolingul yoki parallel matnning imkoniyatini juda qoʻllangan. Dunyoning ko'pchiligi dunyodagi tillardan ko'pchiligi NLP'da yaqinda davomida foydalana olmaydi, chunki ularda matn maʼlumot yoʻq yoki cheksiz maʼlumot yoʻq. Ushbu tillardan NLP texnologiyani oshirish imkoniyatlarini ko'paytirish uchun, biz oddiy tartiyozni o'rganamiz, biz oddiy tillar Resilitlariga ishlatadigan strategiyalarni o'rganamiz, ikkita lugxonlarning foydalanish orqali o'zgartirish imkoniyatlarini o'rganamiz va juda yaxshi tilni koʻchirish Biz texnologiya yoki lab-ketlik maʼlumotlarni birlashtirish uchun boshqa strategiyalarni analyzeriz, va bu maʼlumot imkoniyatlarida monolingul yoki parallel matnni qanday birlashtirish mumkin. 3 vazifalar ichida 19 ta ta xil tilga ega bo'lgan so'zlarimiz 5 va 15 pochta davomida yaxshi o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. Umumiy, bizning o'qituvchimiz, NLP metodlarini yangi minglab tillarda o'zgartirish mumkin, yangi texnologiya orqali ishlab chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Hiệu quả của các mô hình premưa ngôn ngữ đa dạng đều phụ thuộc vào khả năng có độc ngôn ngữ hay chữ song song có trong ngôn ngữ đích. Vì thế đa s ố ngôn ngữ trên thế giới không thể chấp nhận được thành công tiết của nó vì chúng không có chỉ dực văn hoạch. Để mở rộng khả năng sử dụng công nghệ độc lập lập lập lập lập trong những ngôn ngữ thấp kém này, chúng tôi đã nghiên cứu các chiến lược giúp thư giãn sự dựa vào các nguồn ngôn ngữ thông qua sử dụng ngôn ngữ hai thứ, một tài nguyên thay thế với mức ngôn ngữ tốt hơn. Chúng tôi phân tích các chiến lược khác nhau để tổng hợp các dữ liệu có cấu trúc hoặc dán nhãn bằng ngôn ngữ, và làm thế nào kết hợp dữ liệu này với độc ngôn ngữ hoặc chữ song song nếu có. Đối với 19, hai ngôn ngữ dưới đại diện trong các nhiệm vụ thứ ba, phương pháp của chúng ta dẫn đến một cải tiến liên tục cho đến năm và 15 là với và không có phần văn bản ngôn ngữ khác. Nói chung, nghiên cứu của chúng tôi nhấn mạnh cách thức thức thức thức dùng của ngôn ngữ NLP có thể thích nghi với hàng ngàn thứ ngôn ngữ bị thiếu bởi công nghệ hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Ефективността на многоезичните предварително обучени модели е силно зависима от наличието на едноезичен или паралелен текст, присъстващ на целевия език. По този начин по-голямата част от световните езици не могат да се възползват от скорошния напредък в НЛП, тъй като те нямат текстови данни или са ограничени. За да разширим възможностите за използване на технологията за НЛП в тези недостатъчно представени езици, систематично изучаваме стратегии, които отпускат зависимостта от конвенционалните езикови ресурси чрез използването на двуезични лексикони, алтернативен ресурс с много по-добро езиково покритие. Анализираме различни стратегии за синтезиране на текстови или етикетирани данни с помощта на лексикони и как тези данни могат да бъдат комбинирани с едноезичен или паралелен текст, когато има такива. За 19 недостатъчно представени езика в рамките на 3 задачи нашите методи водят до последователни подобрения от до 5 и 15 точки съответно с и без допълнителен едноезичен текст. Като цяло нашето проучване подчертава как методите на НЛП могат да бъдат адаптирани към хиляди други езици, които не са обслужвани от съвременните технологии.', 'da': 'Udførelsen af flersprogede prætrænede modeller afhænger i høj grad af tilgængeligheden af ensproget eller parallel tekst på et målsprog. De fleste af verdens sprog kan således ikke drage fordel af de seneste fremskridt inden for NLP, da de ikke har nogen eller begrænsede tekstdata. For at udvide mulighederne for at bruge NLP-teknologi på disse underrepræsenterede sprog studerer vi systematisk strategier, der afslapper afhængigheden af konventionelle sprogressourcer gennem brug af tosprogede leksikoner, en alternativ ressource med langt bedre sprogdækning. Vi analyserer forskellige strategier til at syntetisere tekstdata eller mærkede data ved hjælp af leksikoner, og hvordan disse data kan kombineres med ensproget eller parallel tekst, når de er tilgængelige. For 19 underrepræsenterede sprog på tværs af 3 opgaver fører vores metoder til konsekvente forbedringer på op til 5 og 15 point med og uden ekstra ensproget tekst. Samlet set fremhæver vores undersøgelse, hvordan NLP metoder kan tilpasses tusindvis af flere sprog, der er underbetjent af nuværende teknologi.', 'nl': 'De prestaties van meertalige voorgetrainde modellen zijn sterk afhankelijk van de beschikbaarheid van eentalige of parallelle tekst in een doeltaal. De meeste talen van de wereld kunnen dus niet profiteren van recente vooruitgang in NLP omdat ze geen of beperkte tekstgegevens hebben. Om de mogelijkheden van het gebruik van NLP-technologie in deze ondervertegenwoordigde talen uit te breiden, bestuderen we systematisch strategieën die de afhankelijkheid van conventionele taalbronnen verminderen door het gebruik van tweetalige lexicons, een alternatieve bron met veel betere taaldekking. We analyseren verschillende strategieën om tekstuele of gelabelde gegevens te synthetiseren met behulp van lexicons, en hoe deze gegevens kunnen worden gecombineerd met eentalige of parallelle tekst indien beschikbaar. Voor 19 ondervertegenwoordigde talen in drie taken leiden onze methoden tot consistente verbeteringen van maximaal 5 en 15 punten met respectievelijk en zonder extra eentalige tekst. Over het algemeen benadrukt onze studie hoe NLP-methoden kunnen worden aangepast aan duizenden andere talen die niet worden bediend door de huidige technologie.', 'hr': 'Proizvodnja multijezičkih pretkišnih modela visoko zavisi od dostupnosti monojezičkog ili paralelnog teksta prisutnog na ciljnom jeziku. Dakle, većina jezika svijeta ne može koristiti od nedavnog napretka u NLP-u jer nemaju ili ograničene tekstualne podatke. Da bi se proširili mogućnosti koristiti NLP tehnologiju na ovim podpredstavljenim jezicima, sistematski istražujemo strategije koje opuštaju pouzdanost na konvencionalne jezičke resurse kroz korištenje dvojezičkih leksikona, alternativnog resursa sa mnogo boljim jezičkim pokrivanjem. Analiziramo različite strategije za sinteziranje tekstualnih ili etiketiranih podataka koristeći leksikone i kako se podaci mogu kombinirati s monojezičkim ili paralelnim tekstom kada su dostupni. Za 19 manje predstavljenih jezika preko 3 zadataka, naše metode dovode do konsekventnih poboljšanja do 5 i 15 bodova s dodatnim monojezičkim tekstom. Naša studija naglašava kako se metode NLP mogu prilagoditi tisućama jezika koje su pod uslugama trenutne tehnologije.', 'de': 'Die Leistungsfähigkeit mehrsprachiger vortrainierter Modelle hängt stark davon ab, ob ein- oder paralleler Text in einer Zielsprache vorhanden ist. Daher können die meisten Sprachen der Welt nicht von den jüngsten Fortschritten im NLP profitieren, da sie keine oder nur begrenzte Textdaten haben. Um die Möglichkeiten des Einsatzes der NLP-Technologie in diesen unterrepräsentierten Sprachen zu erweitern, untersuchen wir systematisch Strategien, die die Abhängigkeit von konventionellen Sprachressourcen durch den Einsatz zweisprachiger Lexikone, einer alternativen Ressource mit viel besserer Sprachabdeckung, erleichtern. Wir analysieren verschiedene Strategien, um textuelle oder beschriftete Daten mithilfe von Lexikonen zu synthetisieren und wie diese Daten, sofern verfügbar, mit einsprachigem oder parallelem Text kombiniert werden können. Für 19-unterrepräsentierte Sprachen über 3-Aufgaben hinweg führen unsere Methoden zu konsistenten Verbesserungen von bis zu 5- und 15-Punkten mit bzw. ohne extra einsprachigen Text. Insgesamt zeigt unsere Studie, wie NLP-Methoden an Tausende weitere Sprachen angepasst werden können, die von der aktuellen Technologie unterbedient werden.', 'id': 'Pertunjukan model multi-bahasa yang dilatih terlebih dahulu sangat tergantung pada keberhasilan teks monobahasa atau paralel yang ada dalam bahasa sasaran. Jadi, kebanyakan bahasa dunia tidak dapat mengambil manfaat dari kemajuan baru-baru ini di NLP karena mereka tidak memiliki atau data teks terbatas. Untuk memperluas kemungkinan menggunakan teknologi NLP dalam bahasa-bahasa yang kurang mewakili ini, kami secara sistematis mempelajari strategi yang meringankan pendekatan pada sumber daya bahasa konvensional melalui menggunakan leksikon dua bahasa, sumber daya alternatif dengan penutupan bahasa yang jauh lebih baik. Kami menganalisis strategi berbeda untuk sintesis data tekstual atau labeled menggunakan leksikon, dan bagaimana data ini dapat digabung dengan teks monobahasa atau paralel jika tersedia. Untuk 19 bahasa dibawah-mewakili melalui 3 tugas, metode kami menyebabkan peningkatan konsisten hingga 5 dan 15 poin dengan dan tanpa teks monobahasa ekstra secara sesuai. Secara keseluruhan, penelitian kami menunjukkan bagaimana metode NLP dapat diadaptasi ke ribuan bahasa lainnya yang tidak diberikan oleh teknologi saat ini.', 'ko': '다중 언어 예비 훈련 모델의 성능은 어느 정도에 목표 언어의 단어나 평행 텍스트의 가용성에 달려 있다.따라서 세계의 대다수 언어는 NLP의 최신 진전에서 이익을 얻을 수 없다. 왜냐하면 그들은 유한한 텍스트 데이터만 있거나 없기 때문이다.이러한 대표적으로 부족한 언어에서 NLP 기술을 사용할 가능성을 확대하기 위해 우리는 이중 언어 사전을 사용하여 전통적인 언어 자원에 대한 의존을 늦추는 전략을 체계적으로 연구했다. 이중 언어 사전은 범위가 더욱 넓은 대체 자원이다.우리는 어휘를 사용하여 텍스트나 표기 데이터를 합성하는 서로 다른 전략과 이런 데이터가 사용할 때 단어나 평행 텍스트와 어떻게 결합되는지 분석했다.3개 임무 중 19개 대표적으로 부족한 언어에 대해 우리의 방법은 각각 별도의 단어 텍스트가 있는 것과 없는 상황에서 일치성을 5점과 15점 높였다.전반적으로 말하자면 우리의 연구는 NLP 방법이 현재 기술이 만족하지 못하는 수천 가지 언어에 어떻게 적응하는지를 강조했다.', 'fa': 'فعالیت مدلهای زیادی زبان\u200cها بسیار بستگی به موجودات متن تنها زبان یا پارالی که در زبان هدف وجود دارد بستگی دارد. بنابراین بیشتر زبانهای جهان از پیشرفت اخیر در NLP سود نمی\u200cدهند چون داده\u200cهای متن یا محدودیت ندارند. برای گسترش احتمالات استفاده از تکنولوژی NLP در این زبانهای زیر نماینده، ما استراتژی\u200cهای سیستماتیک تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که به وسیله استفاده از زبان\u200cهای دوزبانی، استراتژی\u200cهای زیادی با پوشش زبان\u200cهای بهتر آرامش می\u200cدهند. ما استراتژی های متفاوتی را برای ترکیب داده های متن یا نقاشی با استفاده از لکسیون تحلیل می کنیم، و چگونه این داده ها می توانند با متن متن متفاوتی یا متفاوتی در موقع موجود ترکیب شوند. برای ۱۹ زبان زیر نماینده در ۳ وظیفه، روش\u200cهای ما به سوی تطویح\u200cکننده\u200cهای تا ۵ و ۱۵ نقطه با و بدون متن یک زبان بیشتری می\u200cرسد. در کل، تحقیقات ما مشخص می\u200cکند که چگونه روش\u200cهای NLP می\u200cتوانند با هزاران زبان بیشتری که توسط تکنولوژی فعلی تحت خدمت قرار دارند adapt شوند.', 'sw': 'Utendaji wa mifano ya lugha mbalimbali unategemea sana upatikanaji wa teknolojia ya lugha za kiutaifa au maandishi yanayowekwa katika lugha ya lengo. Kwa hiyo, lugha nyingi za dunia hazina faida ya maendeleo ya hivi karibuni ya NLP kwa sababu hawana taarifa za maandishi au isiyo na mipaka. Ili kuongeza uwezekano wa kutumia teknolojia ya NLP katika lugha hizi ambazo hazina uwakilishi, tunatafiti mikakati kwa mfumo ambao huvuta kutegemea rasilimali za lugha za kawaida kupitia matumizi ya lexico mbili, rasilimali mbadala yenye habari bora za lugha. Tunafahamu mbinu tofauti za kukusanya taarifa za maandishi au zilizowekwa kwa kutumia lexico, na jinsi taarifa hizi zinavyoweza kuunganishwa na maandishi yanayofanana na lugha za kimonolinguli au yenye maandishi yanavyopatikana. Kwa lugha 19 zenye uwakilishi katika kazi tatu, mbinu zetu zinasababisha maboresho ya kuendelea hadi pointi 5 na 15 zikiwa na bila maandishi ya ziada ya lugha za kimonolinguli. ) Kwa ujumla, utafiti wetu unaonyesha namna mbinu za NLP zinavyoweza kubadilishwa kwa maelfu ya lugha nyingine zinazotumiwa na teknolojia ya sasa.', 'tr': "Birn채챌e dilli 철ns체zlen첵채n nusgalary흫 t채siri bir maksada dilinde bolan monodil 첵a-da parallel metin bar. 힇onu흫 체챌in d체n첵채ni흫 k철p dilinde NLP'da 첵akyn wagtlary흫 철n체minden 첵okary bolup bilme첵채r, 첵철ne 첵okary tekst maglumatyny흫 첵ok 첵a 챌ykyp bilme첵채r. NLP tehnologi첵asyny bu al챌ak dillerde ulanmak 체챌in sistematik g철rn체힊 dillerde, ikinji dil ling체흫 ulanmasynda adalat diller 체챌in ynamlylygy we gowy g철rn체힊 bilen ba힊ga bir 챌er챌ew ullan첵arys. Biz farkl캇 stratejileri leksikler kullanarak metin 첵a-da etiketli maglumatlary syntetize etmek 체챌in analiz edip, we bu maglumatlar monodil 첵a paralel metin bilen n채hili birle힊tirilebilir. 3 zady흫 i챌inde 19-ini흫 a힊aky g철rn체힊li diller 체챌in, bizi흫 metodlarymyz 5 we 15 punktlere di흫e 첵eterli bir dil bilen we 첵eterli bir tekst bolmadygyny di흫le첵채r. Munu흫 첵agda첵ynda, bizi흫 철wrenmerimiz NLP metodlaryny흫 h채zirki tehnologi첵a tarapyndan u첵gunla첵an m체흫ler챌e dillere n채hili 체첵tgedilebilirini 첵agtyla첵ar.", 'am': 'የብዙ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢ እና በተቃውሞ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የተገኘ እና የተለየ ጽሑፍ ማግኘት በመጠቀም ላይ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም የዓለም ቋንቋዎች ብዙዎቹም የአሁኑን የኢንኤላም ግንኙነት ወይም የተደረገው የጽሑፍ ዳታ ስለሌላቸው ከቅርብ ግንኙነት አይጠቅሙም፡፡ በቋንቋዎች ውስጥ የNLP ቴክሎጂ ለመጠቀም፣ በተግባር ቋንቋዎች ላይ የሚታመን የቋንቋ ሀብትን በመጠቀም፣ የበለጠ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ክፍተቶችን በመጠቀም የሚለውጥ የክፍል ዕቃ እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ የጽሑፍ ወይም የጽሑፍ ዳታዎችን በመቀነስ እናስተምር ዘንድ የተለያየ ስርዓት እናስተውላለን፣ ይህም ዳታዎች በተገኘ ጊዜ በሞሎልጋል ወይም በተያያያዩ ጽሑፍ እንዴት እንዲገኙ ይችላል፡፡ ለ19 በ3 ስራ ውስጥ ባለው ቋንቋዎች፣ መንገዳችን ወደ 5 እና 15 ነጥቦች እና በተጨማሪው የሞሎንቋል ጽሑፍ ለማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ በሁሉም፣ ትምህርታችን የNLP ሥርዓት በሺሕ ቋንቋዎች ላይ እንዴት እንዲቀላቀል ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Performanca e modeleve shumëgjuhësore të stërvitura është shumë e varur nga disponueshmëria e tekstit monogjuhësor paralel të pranishëm në një gjuhë objektive. Kështu, shumica e gjuhëve të botës nuk mund të përfitojë nga përparimi i fundit në NLP pasi nuk kanë të dhëna tekstuale apo të kufizuara. Për të zgjeruar mundësitë e përdorimit të teknologjisë NLP në këto gjuhë të nënpërfaqësuara, ne studiojmë sistematikisht strategji që lehtësojnë mbështetjen në burimet e gjuhës konvencionale nëpërmjet përdorimit të lexikonëve dygjuhësh, një burim alternativ me mbulim shumë më të mirë gjuhësh. Ne analizojmë strategji të ndryshme për sintetizimin e të dhënave tekstuale apo të etiketuara duke përdorur lexikona dhe se si këto të dhëna mund të kombinohen me tekst monogjuhësor paralel kur janë në dispozicion. Për 19 gjuhë të nënpërfaqësuara nëpër 3 detyra, metodat tona çojnë në përmirësime konsistente deri në 5 dhe 15 pikë me dhe pa tekst ekstra monogjuhës respektivisht. Overall, our study highlights how NLP methods can be adapted to thousands more languages that are under-served by current technology.', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու նախադասական մոդելների արտադրողությունը շատ կախված է նպատակային լեզուում գոյություն ունի միալեզու կամ զուգահեռ տեքստի հասանելիության վրա: Այսպիսով, աշխարհի լեզուների մեծամասնությունը չի կարող շահույթ ունենալ ՆԼՊ-ի վերջին զարգացումից, քանի որ դրանք չունեն կամ սահմանափակ տեքստային տվյալներ: Որպեսզի մեծացնենք ՆԼՊ տեխնոլոգիաների օգտագործման հնարավորությունները այս թերներկայացված լեզուներում, մենք սիստեմատիկ ուսումնասիրում ենք ռազմավարություններ, որոնք հանգստանում են կախվածությունը ավանդական լեզվային ռեսուրսների վրա երկլեզու լեքսիկոնների օգտագործման միջո We analyze different strategies to synthesize textual or labeled data using lexicons, and how this data can be combined with monolingual or parallel text when available.  For 19 under-represented languages across 3 tasks, our methods lead to consistent improvements of up to 5 and 15 points with and without extra monolingual text respectively.   Ընդհանուր առմամբ, մեր ուսումնասիրությունը ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչպես կարող են ՆԼՊ մեթոդները հարմարվել ավելի հազարավոր լեզուների հետ, որոնք ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիաների կողմից թերծառայում են:', 'bn': 'মাল্টিভাষার প্রেমেন্ট মডেলের প্রদর্শনীতে লক্ষ্য ভাষায় উপস্থিত মোনোলিভাল অথবা প্যারালেল লেখার প্রাপ্তির উপর ভরসা করে। তাই বিশ্বের বেশীরভাগ ভাষা এনএলপিতে সাম্প্রতিক উন্নয়ন থেকে কোন উপকার করতে পারে না কারণ তাদের কোনো টেক্সচুয়াল ডাট এনএলপি প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহারের সম্ভাবনা বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য আমরা স্বাভাবিকভাবে গবেষণা করি কৌশল যা দুই ভাষাভাষী লেক্সিকোন ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে সাধারণ ভাষার সম্পদের উপর নি লেক্সিকোন ব্যবহার করে টেক্সচুয়াল অথবা লেবেলের তথ্য সিন্টেট করার জন্য বিভিন্ন কৌশল বিশ্লেষণ করি, এবং যখন প্রাপ্ত হলে এই তথ্য কিভাবে মোনো তিন কাজের মধ্যে ১৯ জনের নীচের ভাষাকে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য, আমাদের পদ্ধতি পর্যন্ত ৫ এবং ১৫ পয়েন্ট পর্যন্ত উন্নতির সাথে এবং অতিরিক্ সাধারণত, আমাদের গবেষণা তুলে ধরেছে কিভাবে এনএলপি পদ্ধতি আরো হাজার ভাষায় যা বর্তমান প্রযুক্তির দ্বারা সেবা প্রদ', 'az': "Müxtəlif dillərin əvvəlki modellərin performansı bir məqsəd dilində bulunan monodil və paralel metin faydalanmasına çox bağlıdır. Beləliklə, dünyanın dillərinin çoxu NLP'nin son tədbirindən fayda verə bilməz, çünki onlar textual məlumatları yoxdur. NLP teknolojisini bu düşük dillərdə istifadə etmək üçün sistematik tədbirləri təhsil edirik ki, iki dil leksiklərinin istifadəsi ilə, daha yaxşı dil örtükləri ilə müxtəlif bir çoxlu istifadə edilən alternatif çoxlu çoxlu istifadə edir. Biz məlumatları lexicons vasitəsilə sintezləmək üçün müxtəlif stratejilərlə analiz edirik və bu məlumatları mümkün olduğu zaman monodil və paralel məlumatlarla necə birləşdirə bilər. Üç işin altındakı 19 dillərin içində, metodlarımız 5 və 15 nöqtələrinə müəyyən bir tərzdə və əlavə monodil metinə sahib olmaqla müəyyən bir yol göstərir. Həqiqətən, bizim təhsil təhsil etmək üçün NLP metodlarının əsas teknoloji ilə istifadə edilən milyonlarla daha çox dillərə uyğunlaşdırılmasını işıqlandırır.", 'bs': 'Proizvodnja multijezičkih pretkišnih modela visoko zavisi od dostupnosti monojezičkog ili paralelnog teksta prisutnog na ciljnom jeziku. Dakle, većina jezika svijeta ne može koristiti od nedavnog napretka u NLP-u jer nemaju ili ograničene tekstualne podatke. Da bi se proširili mogućnosti koristiti NLP tehnologiju na ovim neposrednim jezicima, sistematski proučavamo strategije koje opuštaju pouzdanost na konvencionalne jezičke resurse putem korištenja dvojezičkih leksikona, alternativnog resursa sa mnogo boljim jezičkim pokrivanjem. Analiziramo različite strategije za sinteziranje tekstualnih ili etiketiranih podataka koristeći leksikone i kako se ovi podaci mogu kombinirati sa monojezičkim ili paralelnim tekstom kada su dostupni. Za 19 manje predstavljenih jezika preko 3 zadataka, naše metode vode do konsekventnih poboljšanja do 5 i 15 bodova sa dodatnim monojezičkim tekstom. Naša studija naglašava kako se metode NLP mogu prilagoditi na hiljade više jezika koje su pod uslovom trenutne tehnologije.', 'cs': 'Výkon vícejazyčných předtrénovaných modelů je velmi závislý na dostupnosti jednojjazyčného nebo paralelního textu v cílovém jazyce. Většina světových jazyků tedy nemůže těžit z nedávného pokroku v NLP, protože nemají žádné nebo omezené textové údaje. Abychom rozšířili možnosti využití technologie NLP v těchto nedostatečně zastoupených jazycích, systematicky studujeme strategie, které uvolní závislost na konvenčních jazykových zdrojích pomocí dvojjazyčných lexikonů, alternativního zdroje s mnohem lepším jazykovým pokrytím. Analyzujeme různé strategie syntetizace textových nebo označených dat pomocí lexikonů a jak lze tato data kombinovat s jednojzyčným nebo paralelním textem, pokud jsou k dispozici. U devatenácti nedostatečně zastoupených jazyků napříč třemi úkoly vedou naše metody k konzistentnímu zlepšování až pěti a patnácti bodů s a bez dalšího jednojjazyčného textu. Celkově naše studie zdůrazňuje, jak lze metody NLP přizpůsobit tisícům dalších jazyků, které jsou nedostatečně obsluhovány současnou technologií.', 'af': "Die prestasie van multilinglike pretreëerde modele is baie afhanklik van die beskikbaarheid van monolinglike of parallele teks wat in 'n teiken taal voorsien is. So, die meeste van die wêreld se tale kan nie voordeel van onlangse vordering in NLP omdat hulle geen of beperk tekstuurlike data het nie. Om moontlikhede van NLP-teknologie in hierdie ondersteunde tale te uitbrei, ondersoek ons sistematiese studie strategies wat die vertrouing op konvensionele taal hulpbronne verlaat deur die gebruik van bilinguele leksikone, 'n alternatiewe hulpbron met baie beter taal omdekking. Ons analiseer verskillende strategies om tekstuele of etiketeerde data te sintetiseer deur lexicons te gebruik, en hoe hierdie data kan gekombineer word met monotale of parallele teks wanneer beskikbaar is. Vir 19 ondersteunde tale oor 3 taak lei ons metodes na konsistente verbeteringe van tot 5 en 15 punte met en sonder ekstra monotale teks respektief. Alles verlig ons studie hoe NLP metodes kan aanpas word na duisende meer tale wat deur huidige teknologie onder gedien word.", 'et': 'Mitmekeelsete eeltreenitud mudelite tulemuslikkus sõltub suuresti sihtkeeles esineva ühe- või paralleelse teksti kättesaadavusest. Seega ei saa enamik maailma keeli uue õppekava hiljutistest edusammudest kasu saada, sest nende tekstiandmed puuduvad või on piiratud. Selleks et laiendada NLP tehnoloogia kasutamise võimalusi nendes alaesindatud keeltes, uurime süstemaatiliselt strateegiaid, mis leevendavad sõltuvust tavapärastest keeleressurssidest, kasutades kahekeelseid leksikone, mis on alternatiivne ressurss, millel on palju parem keeleülekanne. Analüüsime erinevaid strateegiaid tekstiliste või märgistatud andmete sünteesimiseks leksikonide abil ning kuidas neid andmeid saab kombineerida ühekeelse või paralleelse tekstiga, kui need on kättesaadavad. 19 alaesindatud keele puhul kolmes ülesandes on meie meetoditega võimalik järjepidevalt parandada kuni 5 ja 15 punkti võrra koos täiendava ühekeelse tekstiga või ilma. Üldiselt rõhutatakse meie uuringus, kuidas uue õppekava meetodeid saab kohandada tuhandetele teistele keeltele, mida praegune tehnoloogia ei kasuta.', 'ca': "El rendiment de models multillengües de pré-entrenament depèn molt de la disponibilitat de text monollengüe o paral·lel present en un llenguatge d'objectiu. Així doncs, la majoria de les llengües mundials no poden beneficiar-se del progrés recent en NLP, perquè no tenen dades textuals o limitades. Per ampliar les possibilitats d'utilitzar la tecnologia NLP en aquestes llengües poc representades, estudiem sistemàticament estratègies que relaxen la confiança en recursos de llengües convencionals mitjançant l'ús de lexicòns bilingües, un recurso alternativ amb molt millor cobertura de llengües. Analitzem diferents estratègies per sintetitzar dades textuals o etiquetades utilitzant lexicòns, i com aquestes dades es poden combinar amb text monolingüe o paral·lel quan està disponible. Per 19 llengües sota representades en tres tasques, els nostres mètodes porten a millores consistents de fins a 5 i 15 punts amb i sense text monolingüe extra respectivament. En general, el nostre estudi destaca com els mètodes del NLP poden adaptar-se a milers de llengües més que no serveixen gaire la tecnologia actual.", 'fi': 'Monikielisten esikoulutettujen mallien suorituskyky riippuu suuresti kohdekielellä esiintyvän yhden- tai rinnakkaistekstin saatavuudesta. Suurin osa maailman kielistä ei siis voi hyötyä NLP:n viimeaikaisesta kehityksestä, koska niillä ei ole tekstitietoja tai niitä on vain vähän. Laajentaaksemme mahdollisuuksia käyttää NLP-teknologiaa näillä aliedustetuilla kielillä tutkimme systemaattisesti strategioita, jotka helpottavat riippuvuutta perinteisistä kieliresursseista kaksikielisten sanastojen avulla, mikä on vaihtoehtoinen resurssi, jolla on paljon parempi kielikattavuus. Analysoimme erilaisia strategioita tekstuaalisen tai merkityn datan syntetisoimiseksi leksikonien avulla ja miten tätä dataa voidaan yhdistää yksikieliseen tai rinnakkaiseen tekstiin, kun sitä on saatavilla. Menetelmämme johtavat johdonmukaisiin parannuksiin 19 aliedustetussa kielessä kolmessa tehtävässä jopa 5 pisteellä ja ilman ylimääräistä yksikielistä tekstiä 15 pisteellä. Kaiken kaikkiaan tutkimuksemme korostaa, miten NLP-menetelmiä voidaan mukauttaa tuhansille muille kielille, jotka eivät ole nykyisen teknologian käytössä.', 'jv': 'Rasané modelo sing paling langkung dadi, akeh bantuan dipunangé kapan kuwi nggawe gerakan ingkang sampeyan karo nggo langkung sampeyan. Kaya, badharé sing luwih akeh dilané ning dunyo ora bisa dianggap ning NLP iki dadi sing perusahaan yaké ora ono data textual. Tulung iso nggawe peringatan kanggo nggambar tualisang NLP ning limi dianggawe, awak dhéwé sistematik hukum sistematik mataraning nggawe kesempatan kanggo nggawe kesempatan kanggo nggambar aturan sing bakal terus akeh bantuan ingkang dipunanggé, kawula kedaulatan tanggal sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé éngleksi sistem sing sampeyan kanggo sampeyan textual apa etiket data nggambar leksikuns kanggo Diwong-wong, akeh basa sing sumulakno piye perangkat NLP bisa ngejaraké tuatan kanggo langa sing luwih bantuan liyane sing ngejaraké teknôlogi sing ngentambah.', 'sk': 'Učinkovitost večjezičnih predtreniranih modelov je zelo odvisna od razpoložljivosti enojezičnega ali vzporednega besedila v ciljnem jeziku. Zato večina svetovnih jezikov ne more koristiti od nedavnega napredka pri NLP, saj nimajo besedilnih podatkov ali so omejeni. Za razširitev možnosti uporabe tehnologije NLP v teh premalo zastopanih jezikih sistematično preučujemo strategije, ki sprostijo zanašanje na konvencionalne jezikovne vire z uporabo dvojezičnih leksikonov, alternativnega vira z veliko boljšo jezikovno pokritostjo. Analiziramo različne strategije za sintetizacijo besedilnih ali označenih podatkov z uporabo leksikonov in kako jih lahko kombiniramo z enojezičnim ali vzporednim besedilom, če so na voljo. Pri 19 premalo zastopanih jezikih v treh nalogah naše metode vodijo do doslednih izboljšav v višini do 5 in 15 točk z dodatnim enojezičnim besedilom oziroma brez njega. Na splošno naša študija poudarja, kako je mogoče metode NLP prilagoditi na tisoče več jezikov, ki jih sedanja tehnologija premalo uporablja.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་བཀོད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མང་ཙམ་མཐུན་ནི་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡང་ན་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཡིག དེར་བརྟེན། འཛམ་གླིང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་NLP ནང་གི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དང་ཚད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡིག To expand possibilities of using NLP technology in these under-represented languages, we systematically study strategies that relax the reliance of conventional language resources through the use of bilingual lexicons, an alternative resource with much better language coverage. We analyze different strategies to synthesize textual or labeled data using lexicons, and how this data can be combined with monolingual or parallel text when available. ངའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་པའི་བྱ་ཚིག་གསུམ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དེ་ལྔའི་དང་། དེ་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང In general, our study highlights how NLP methods can be adapted to thousands more languages that are under-served by current technology.', 'he': "ביצועים של דוגמנים רבות שפות מתאמנים מראש תלויים במיוחד בהזמינות של טקסט מונושפתי או מקביל הנוכחים בשפה המטרה. Thus, the majority of the world's languages cannot benefit from recent progress in NLP as they have no or limited textual data.  כדי להרחיב אפשרויות להשתמש בטכנולוגיה NLP בשפות אלה שמיוצגות פחות, אנו לומדים באופן שיטתי אסטרטגיות שמרגיעות את תלויה במשאבים שפות קונבנסיונטיים באמצעות השימוש בלקסיקונים שתיים שפות, משאב אלטרנטיבי עם כיסוי שפות הרבה יותר טוב. אנו מנתחים אסטרטגיות שונות לסינטזיה מידע טקסטולי או מסומן באמצעות לקסיקונים, ואיך המידע הזה יכול להיות משולב עם טקסט מונושפתי או מקביל כשזמין. למשך 19 שפות מתעלמות במהלך 3 משימות, השיטות שלנו מובילות לשיפורים קבועים עד 5 ו-15 נקודות עם ולא טקסט מונושפתי נוסף בהתאם. באופן כללי, המחקר שלנו מזכיר כיצד שיטות NLP יכולות להתאים לאלף שפות נוספות שהטכנולוגיה הנוכחית לא מספקת.", 'ha': "Faren misalin misãlai masu cikin multilala na ƙayyade shi yana mai ƙayyade ƙayyadadde da ake iya sãmun littãfin da ke cikin lugha wanda ke gaba da shi. Daga haka, mafi yawansu harshen duniya bã za su iya amfani da jarrabo na farko a cikin NLP sabõda ba su da data na rubutu ko da ƙoramu ba. To, dõmin ka ƙãra furuci wa istigifãtan NLP cikin waɗannan harshen wanda ke da aka ƙaddara shi, za mu karanta kimatattu masu daidaita, game da amfani da rukunan lugha'ura na farko, da amfani da misalin leksisini biyu, da wata resource na dabar-dabar, da mafi kyaun rufe lugha. Tuna yi anayya ga kewayi daban-daban da za'a haɗa takardar littãfi ko kuma da aka rubũta data da aka yi wa littafin leksisin, kuma don a sami da yadda za'a iya haɗa wannan data da littãfin na monoli ko kuma a daidaita matsayin idan yana da amfani. Zuwa ga harshen 19 wanda ke bincike a cikin aikin 3, hanyõyinmu na ƙara koda mafiya kyau zuwa 5 da 15 points da kuma bã da matsayin sauki na sauri. Kayyan da kammala, fassararmu na ƙayyade yadda za'a haɗa hanyõyin NLP zuwa dubu na'yan harshen waɗanda ke da amfani da technical na yanzu."}
{'en': 'Bag-of-Words vs. Graph vs. Sequence in Text Classification: Questioning the Necessity of Text-Graphs and the Surprising Strength of a Wide ', 'ar': 'تضمين جملة BERT الحيادية اللغة', 'fr': 'Intégration de phrases BERT indépendante de la langue', 'es': 'Incrustación de oraciones BERT independiente del idioma', 'pt': 'Incorporação de sentença BERT independente de idioma', 'ja': '言語に依存しないBERT文の埋め込み', 'zh': '语言无关 BERT 句嵌', 'hi': 'भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी BERT वाक्य एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Встраивание предложения BERT для диагностики языка', 'ga': 'Leabú Pianbhreithe BERT agnostic teanga', 'ka': 'Language- agnostic BERT sentence Embedding', 'hu': 'Nyelv-agnosztikus BERT mondat beágyazása', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση πρότασης BERT χωρίς γλώσσα', 'kk': 'Тіл- agnostic BERT сөз ендіруі', 'it': 'Embedding della frase BERT agnostico', 'mk': 'Вклучување на реченица BERT за јазик- агностика', 'lt': 'Kalbos-agnostinis BERT sakinys Įterpiamas', 'ms': 'Bahasa-agnostik Penciptaan Perkataan BERT', 'mn': 'Хол-агностик BERT өгүүлбэр', 'mt': 'Sentenza BERT lingwistika-agnostika', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ- അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി വിധി എംബെഡിങ്ങ്', 'pl': 'Bezjęzykowe osadzanie zdań BERT', 'no': 'Innebygging av språk- agnostisk BERT- teikn', 'ro': 'Încorporarea sentințelor BERT agnostice', 'sr': 'Jezik-agnostički BERT izraz', 'si': 'භාෂා', 'so': 'Xarunta daryeelka deganaanshaha luuqada ee BERT', 'sv': 'Språkagnostisk BERT-meningsbyggnad', 'ta': 'Language- agnostic BERT வாக்கியம் உட்பொதி', 'ur': 'Language- agnostic BERT Sentence Embedding', 'uz': 'Language- agnostic BERT sensor embedded', 'vi': 'Màu nền văn học', 'da': 'Sprogagnostisk BERT-sætningsindlejring', 'hr': 'Jezik-agnostički integracija izraza BERT', 'bg': 'Езиково агностично вграждане на BERT изречение', 'de': 'Sprachunabhängige Einbettung von BERT-Sätzen', 'nl': 'Taal-agnostische BERT-zin insluiten', 'id': 'Bahasa-agnostik BERT Sentence Embedding', 'fa': 'زبان- agnostic BERT', 'tr': 'Diller agnostik BERT sözleri girişdirmek', 'ko': '언어 알 수 없는 문장 삽입', 'sq': 'Gjuha-agnostike', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Sheria ya Lugha ya Kiagnostic BERT', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'af': 'Language- agnostic BERT Sentence Embedding', 'hy': 'Լեզու-ագնոստիկ BER նախադասությունը ներգրավված', 'az': 'Dil-agnostik BERT Sözü İçeri', 'bs': 'Jezik-agnostički integracija izraza BERT', 'bn': 'ভাষা- অ্যাগনোস্টিক বিরুদ্ধে শাস্তি এমবেডিং', 'ca': 'Llingua-agnòstica incorporació de frases BERT', 'cs': 'Vkládání věty BERT bez jazyka', 'et': 'Keelega sõltumatu BERT lause põimimine', 'fi': 'Kieliagnostinen BERT-lauseen upotus', 'jv': 'Jenengan BERT Sentensi nggo kelenggunan', 'sk': 'Vključevanje jezikovnega BERT stavka', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'גזרת משפט BERT אנגוסטית לשפה', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དང་agnostic BERT ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འཇུག'}
{'en': 'Graph neural networks have triggered a resurgence of graph-based text classification methods, defining today’s state of the art. We show that a wide multi-layer perceptron (MLP) using a Bag-of-Words (BoW) outperforms the recent graph-based models TextGCN and HeteGCN in an inductive text classification setting and is comparable with HyperGAT. Moreover, we fine-tune a sequence-based BERT and a lightweight DistilBERT model, which both outperform all state-of-the-art models. These results question the importance of synthetic graphs used in modern text classifiers. In terms of efficiency, DistilBERT is still twice as large as our BoW-based wide MLP, while graph-based models like TextGCN require setting up an \\mathcal{O}(N^2) graph, where N is the vocabulary plus corpus size. Finally, since Transformers need to compute \\mathcal{O}(L^2) attention weights with sequence length L, the MLP models show higher training and inference speeds on datasets with long sequences.', 'fr': "Alors que BERT est une méthode efficace pour apprendre les intégrations de phrases monolingues pour la similitude sémantique et l'apprentissage par transfert basé sur l'intégration, les intégrations de phrases multilingues basées sur BERT n'ont pas encore été explorées. Nous étudions systématiquement les méthodes d'apprentissage de l'intégration de phrases multilingues en combinant les meilleures méthodes d'apprentissage des représentations monolingues et multilingues, y compris\xa0: la modélisation du langage masqué (MLM), la modélisation du langage de traduction (TLM), le classement de traduction à double encodeur et la marge additive softmax . Nous montrons que l'introduction d'un modèle linguistique multilingue préformé réduit considérablement de 80\xa0% la quantité de données de formation parallèle nécessaires pour obtenir de bonnes performances. La composition de la meilleure de ces méthodes produit un modèle qui atteint 83,7\xa0% de précision de récupération de texte bitexte sur 112 langues sur Tatoeba, bien au-dessus des 65,5\xa0% atteints par LASER, tout en restant compétitif sur les bancs d'apprentissage par transfert monolingues. Les données parallèles extraites de CommonCrawl à l'aide de notre meilleur modèle permettent d'entraîner des modèles NMT compétitifs pour en-zh et en-de. Nous publions notre meilleur modèle d'intégration de phrases multilingues pour plus de 109 langues à l'adresse https://tfhub.\nDEV/Google/Labse.", 'es': 'Si bien BERT es un método eficaz para aprender incrustaciones de oraciones monolingües para la similitud semántica y el aprendizaje de transferencia basado en la incrustación, aún no se han explorado las incrustaciones de oraciones multilingües basadas en BERT. Investigamos sistemáticamente los métodos para aprender la incrustación de oraciones multilingües mediante la combinación de los mejores métodos para aprender representaciones monolingües y multilingües, incluidos: modelado de lenguaje enmascarado (MLM), modelado de lenguaje de traducción (TLM), clasificación de traducción de doble codificador y margen aditivo softmax . Demostramos que la introducción de un modelo lingüístico multilingüe previamente entrenado reduce drásticamente la cantidad de datos de capacitación paralela necesarios para lograr un buen rendimiento en un 80%. La composición de lo mejor de estos métodos produce un modelo que logra una precisión de recuperación de bitexto del 83,7% en 112 idiomas en Tatoeba, muy por encima del 65,5% alcanzado por LASER, al tiempo que sigue teniendo un rendimiento competitivo en los parámetros de aprendizaje de transferencia monolingües. Los datos paralelos extraídos de CommonCrawl utilizando nuestro mejor modelo se muestran para entrenar modelos NMT competitivos para en-zh y en-de. Publicamos nuestro mejor modelo de incrustación de frases multilingües para más de 109 idiomas en https://tfhub.\nDesarrollo/Google/LABSE.', 'ar': 'في حين أن BERT هي طريقة فعالة لتعلم حفلات الزفاف أحادية اللغة للتشابه الدلالي وتضمين عمليات النقل القائمة على التعلم القائم على BERT والتي لم يتم استكشافها بعد. نحن نحقق بشكل منهجي في طرق تعلم تضمين الجمل متعددة اللغات من خلال الجمع بين أفضل الطرق لتعلم التمثيلات أحادية اللغة وعبر اللغات بما في ذلك: نمذجة اللغة المقنعة (MLM) ، ونمذجة لغة الترجمة (TLM) ، وترتيب ترجمة التشفير المزدوج ، والهامش الإضافي softmax. نظهر أن تقديم نموذج متعدد اللغات مدرب مسبقًا يقلل بشكل كبير من كمية بيانات التدريب الموازي المطلوبة لتحقيق أداء جيد بنسبة 80٪. ينتج عن تكوين أفضل هذه الأساليب نموذجًا يحقق دقة استرجاع نصوص ثنائية بنسبة 83.7٪ عبر 112 لغة على Tatoeba ، وهو أعلى بكثير من 65.5٪ التي حققتها LASER ، مع استمرار الأداء التنافسي على معايير تعلم التحويل أحادية اللغة. تظهر البيانات الموازية المستخرجة من CommonCrawl باستخدام أفضل نموذج لدينا لتدريب نماذج NMT التنافسية لـ en-zh و en-de. أصدرنا علنًا أفضل نموذج لتضمين الجمل متعدد اللغات لأكثر من 109 لغة على https: // tfhub.\ndev / google / LaBSE.', 'ja': 'BERTは、意味的類似性のための単語文埋め込みと、埋め込みベースの転送学習を学習するための効果的な方法ですが、BERTベースのクロスリンガル文埋め込みはまだ探求されていません。 マスキング言語モデリング（ MLM ）、翻訳言語モデリング（ TLM ）、デュアルエンコーダー翻訳ランキング、および加算マージンソフトマックスを含む、単一言語およびクロスリンガル表現を学習するための最良の方法を組み合わせることにより、多言語文埋め込みを学習するための方法を体系的に調査します。 事前にトレーニングされた多言語モデルを導入すると、良好なパフォーマンスを達成するために必要な並列トレーニングデータの量が劇的に80 ％削減されることが示されています。 これらの方法の中で最も優れたものを構成することで、Tatoeba上の112言語にわたって83.7 ％のバイテクスト検索精度を達成するモデルを生成します。これは、レーザーによって達成された65.5 ％をはるかに上回りますが、一方で単一言語転送学習ベンチマークでは競争力があります。 当社のベストモデルを使用してCommonCrawlから採取された並列データは、en - zhおよびen - deの競合NMTモデルをトレーニングするために示されています。 109以上の言語のための最高の多言語文埋め込みモデルをhttps :// tfhubで公開しています。\ndev/google/LaBSE。', 'pt': 'Embora o BERT seja um método eficaz para aprender incorporações de frases monolíngues para similaridade semântica e aprendizado de transferência baseado em incorporação, as incorporações de frases multilíngues baseadas em BERT ainda precisam ser exploradas. Investigamos sistematicamente métodos para aprender incorporações de frases multilíngues combinando os melhores métodos para aprender representações monolíngues e multilíngues, incluindo: modelagem de linguagem mascarada (MLM), modelagem de linguagem de tradução (TLM), classificação de tradução de codificador duplo e softmax de margem aditiva. Mostramos que a introdução de um modelo de idioma multilíngue pré-treinado reduz drasticamente a quantidade de dados de treinamento paralelo necessários para obter um bom desempenho em 80%. Compor o melhor desses métodos produz um modelo que atinge 83,7% de precisão de recuperação bi-texto em 112 idiomas no Tatoeba, bem acima dos 65,5% alcançados pelo LASER, enquanto ainda apresenta desempenho competitivo em benchmarks de aprendizado de transferência monolíngue. Dados paralelos extraídos do CommonCrawl usando nosso melhor modelo são mostrados para treinar modelos NMT competitivos para en-zh e en-de. Lançamos publicamente nosso melhor modelo de incorporação de frases multilíngues para mais de 109 idiomas em https://tfhub.\ndev/google/LaBSE.', 'ru': 'Хотя BERT является эффективным методом обучения одноязычным вложениям предложений для семантического сходства и обучения переносу на основе вложений, кросс-язычные вложения предложений на основе BERT еще предстоит исследовать. Мы систематически исследуем методы обучения многоязычным вложениям предложений, комбинируя лучшие методы обучения одноязычным и кросс-лингвистическим представлениям, включая: моделирование языка в масках (MLM), моделирование языка перевода (TLM), ранжирование перевода с помощью двойного кодировщика и softmax аддитивной маржи. Мы показываем, что внедрение предварительно обученной многоязычной языковой модели резко сокращает объем параллельных обучающих данных, необходимых для достижения хорошей производительности на 80%. Составление наилучшей из этих методов производит модель, которая достигает 83,7% точности двухтекстового поиска по 112 языкам на Tatoeba, что намного выше 65,5%, достигнутых с помощью ЛАЗЕРА, при этом все еще демонстрируя конкурентоспособность на одноязычных контрольных показателях обучения передаче. Показано, что параллельные данные, полученные из CommonCrawl с использованием нашей лучшей модели, обучают конкурентоспособным моделям NMT для en-zh и en-de. Мы публично выпускаем нашу лучшую многоязычную модель встраивания предложений для более чем 109 языков по адресу https://tfhub.\ndev/google/LaBSE.', 'zh': '虽BERT为学语义相似性与基嵌迁徙之法,而BERT跨语言句嵌犹待探索。 合学单语、跨言之最善者,系统地研多语言句嵌之法,曰:屏蔽语言建模(MLM),译言建模(TLM),双编码器译名加法保证金softmax。 臣等明引预练之多言,可以并行数据量著损 80%。 凡此诸法,Tatoeba成112言语之83.7%双文本检索准确率,远高于LASER成之65.5%,而单语迁学之准犹有竞争力。 用我最佳CommonCrawl掘并行数验可练en-zh与en-de竞争性NMT模形。 https://tfhub 明发用109多种语言最佳语句嵌模。\ndev/google/LaBSE.', 'hi': 'जबकि BERT शब्दार्थ समानता के लिए मोनोलिंगुअल वाक्य एम्बेडिंग सीखने के लिए एक प्रभावी तरीका है और BERT आधारित क्रॉस-लिंगुअल वाक्य एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर आधारित स्थानांतरण सीखने को एम्बेड करना अभी तक खोजा जाना बाकी है। हम व्यवस्थित रूप से मोनोलिंगुअल और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए सर्वोत्तम तरीकों के संयोजन से बहुभाषी वाक्य एम्बेडिंग सीखने के तरीकों की जांच करते हैं: नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडलिंग (एमएलएम), अनुवाद भाषा मॉडलिंग (टीएलएम), दोहरी एनकोडर अनुवाद रैंकिंग, और योजक मार्जिन सॉफ्टमैक्स। हम दिखाते हैं कि एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित बहुभाषी भाषा मॉडल पेश करने से नाटकीय रूप से अच्छे प्रदर्शन को प्राप्त करने के लिए आवश्यक समानांतर प्रशिक्षण डेटा की मात्रा 80% तक कम हो जाती है। इन विधियों में से सर्वश्रेष्ठ की रचना एक मॉडल का उत्पादन करती है जो टैटोबा पर 112 भाषाओं पर 83.7% द्वि-पाठ पुनर्प्राप्ति सटीकता प्राप्त करती है, जो लेजर द्वारा प्राप्त 65.5% से ऊपर है, जबकि अभी भी मोनोलिंगुअल ट्रांसफर लर्निंग बेंचमार्क पर प्रतिस्पर्धात्मक रूप से प्रदर्शन कर रही है। हमारे सबसे अच्छे मॉडल का उपयोग करके CommonCrawl से खनन किए गए समानांतर डेटा को en-zh और en-de के लिए प्रतिस्पर्धी NMT मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए दिखाया गया है। हम सार्वजनिक रूप से https://tfhub पर 109+ भाषाओं के लिए अपना सर्वश्रेष्ठ बहुभाषी वाक्य एम्बेडिंग मॉडल जारी करते हैं।\ndev/google/LaBSE', 'ga': 'Cé gur modh éifeachtach é CRET chun leabú abairtí aonteangacha a fhoghlaim ar mhaithe le cosúlacht shéimeantach agus foghlaim aistrithe bunaithe ar leabú, níl iniúchadh déanta fós ar leabú abairtí trasteangacha bunaithe ar CRET. Déanaimid imscrúdú córasach ar mhodhanna chun leabú abairtí ilteangacha a fhoghlaim trí na modhanna is fearr chun léirithe aonteangacha agus tras-teangacha a fhoghlaim a chomhcheangal lena n-áirítear: samhaltú teanga folaithe (MLM), samhaltú teanga aistriúcháin (TLM), rangú aistriúcháin dé-ionchódóra, agus corrlach breiseán softmax. Léirímid go laghdaítear go mór an méid sonraí oiliúna comhthreomhar a theastaíonn chun dea-fheidhmíocht a bhaint amach faoi 80%. Cruthaíonn cumadóireacht na modhanna seo múnla a ghnóthaíonn cruinneas aisghabhála déthéacs 83.7% thar 112 teanga ar Tatoeba, i bhfad os cionn an 65.5% a ghnóthaigh LASER, agus é fós ag feidhmiú go hiomaíoch ar thagarmharcanna foghlama aistrithe aonteangacha. Taispeántar sonraí comhthreomhara a bhaintear as CommonCrawl ag baint úsáide as ár múnla is fearr chun samhlacha iomaíocha NMT a oiliúint le haghaidh en-zh agus en-de. Eisímid go poiblí ár múnla leabaithe abairtí ilteangach is fearr le haghaidh 109+ teanga ag https://tfhub.\ndev/google/LaBSE.', 'ka': 'BERT არის მონოლენგური წესების შესწავლების ეფექტიური პროცემი, როგორც სემონტიკური სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადას ჩვენ სისტემატიკურად შევსწავლოთ მეტები მრავალური სიტყვების შესწავლებისთვის მონოლენგური და მრავალენგური გამოსწავლებისთვის უკეთესი მეტების შესწავლობით, რომელიც: მაქსიტური ენის მოდელინგი (MLM), განსაგულებული ენის მოდელინგი ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ პროგრამიკურად მრავალური ენის მოდელის გადატვირთვა, რომელიც 80%-ზე უნდა გავაკეთოთ პარალელური განსწავლების მონაცემები. ამ მეტირების ყველაზე საუკეთესო შექმნა იქნება მოდელი, რომელიც მიიღებს 83.7% ორ-ტექსტის წარმოიღება 112 ენაზე Tatoeba, 65.5% უფრო მეტი, რომელიც LASER-ის მიღებულია, რომელიც კონპექტიურად მონოლენგური გასწავ Name https://tfhub.', 'el': 'Ενώ το BERT είναι μια αποτελεσματική μέθοδος για την εκμάθηση μονογλωσσικών προτάσεων ενσωμάτωσης για σημασιολογική ομοιότητα και ενσωμάτωση βασισμένης στη μάθηση μεταφοράς με βάση το BERT, οι διασγλωσσικές ενσωμάτωση προτάσεων που βασίζονται στο BERT δεν έχουν ακόμη διερευνηθεί. Ερευνούμε συστηματικά μεθόδους εκμάθησης πολυγλωσσικών ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων συνδυάζοντας τις καλύτερες μεθόδους εκμάθησης μονογλωσσικών και διγλωσσικών αναπαραστάσεων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων: μοντελοποίηση μασκαρισμένης γλώσσας (μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών μετάφρασης (μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών μετάφρασης), ταξινόμηση μετάφρασης διπλού κωδικοποιητή και πρόσθετο περιθώριο. Δείχνουμε ότι η εισαγωγή ενός προ-εκπαιδευμένου πολύγλωσσου μοντέλου γλώσσας μειώνει δραματικά την ποσότητα των δεδομένων παράλληλης εκπαίδευσης που απαιτούνται για την επίτευξη καλής απόδοσης κατά 80%. Η σύνθεση των καλύτερων αυτών μεθόδων παράγει ένα μοντέλο που επιτυγχάνει 83,7% ακρίβεια ανάκτησης δικειμένου πάνω από 112 γλώσσες στο Tatoeba, πολύ πάνω από το 65,5% που επιτυγχάνεται από το LASER, ενώ εξακολουθεί να αποδίδει ανταγωνιστικά σε κριτήρια εκμάθησης μονογλωσσίας μεταφοράς. Παράλληλα δεδομένα που εξάγονται από το χρησιμοποιώντας το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας φαίνεται ότι εκπαιδεύουν ανταγωνιστικά μοντέλα για και Δημοσιεύουμε δημόσια το καλύτερο πολύγλωσσο μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων για γλώσσες 109+ στο https://tfhub.', 'it': "Mentre il BERT è un metodo efficace per imparare le incorporazioni di frasi monolingue per la somiglianza semantica e l'incorporazione basata sul trasferimento, le incorporazioni di frasi cross-lingual basate su BERT devono ancora essere esplorate. Investighiamo sistematicamente i metodi per l'apprendimento delle incorporazioni di frasi multilingue combinando i migliori metodi per l'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni monolingue e cross-lingual, tra cui: modellazione del linguaggio mascherato (MLM), modellazione del linguaggio di traduzione (TLM), classificazione delle traduzioni dual encoder e softmax additivo margin. Dimostriamo che l'introduzione di un modello linguistico multilingue pre-addestrato riduce drasticamente la quantità di dati di formazione parallela necessari per ottenere buone prestazioni dell'80%. Componendo il meglio di questi metodi si ottiene un modello che raggiunge l'83,7% di precisione di recupero bi-testo su 112 lingue su Tatoeba, ben al di sopra del 65,5% ottenuto con LASER, pur continuando a performare in modo competitivo sui benchmark di trasferimento monolingue. I dati paralleli estratti da CommonCrawl utilizzando il nostro modello migliore hanno dimostrato di formare modelli NMT competitivi per en-zh ed en-de. https://tfhub.", 'hu': 'Míg a BERT hatékony módszer a szemantikai hasonlóságok egynyelvű mondatbágyazásának tanulására és a transzfer alapú tanulás beágyazására, a BERT alapú, többnyelvű mondatbágyazásokat még fel kell vizsgálni. Szisztematikusan vizsgáljuk a többnyelvű mondatbeágyazások tanulásának módszereit az egynyelvű és többnyelvű reprezentációk tanulására szolgáló legjobb módszerek kombinálásával, beleértve a maszkos nyelv modellezését (MLM), fordítási nyelv modellezését (TLM), kettős kódoló fordítási rangsor és additív margin softmax. Megmutatjuk, hogy egy előre képzett többnyelvű nyelvi modell bevezetése jelentősen csökkenti a jó teljesítmény eléréséhez szükséges párhuzamos képzési adatok mennyiségét 80%-kal. Ezek közül a legjobb módszerek összeállítása olyan modellt eredményez, amely 112 nyelven a Tatoebán 83,7%-os kétszöveges lekérdezési pontosságot ér el, jóval meghaladja a LASER 65,5%-át, miközben továbbra is versenyképes teljesítményt nyújt az egynyelvű transzfer tanulási referenciaértékeken. A CommonCrawlból a legjobb modellünkkel bányászott párhuzamos adatok bizonyítják, hogy versenyképes NMT modelleket képeznek az en-zh és en-de számára. https://tfhub.', 'kk': 'BERT - семантикалық ұқсас пен негіздеген транспорт оқыту үшін бірнеше тілдік сөздерді үйрену әдісі болғанда, бірнеше тілдік сөздерді ендіру әдісі болмайды. Біз көптілік сөздерді үйрену әдістерін жүйелік түрде зерттеп, бірнеше тілді және көптілік сөздерді үйрену әдістерін біріктіріп: қалқан тілді моделизация (MLM), аудармалы тілді моделизация (TLM), екі кодер аудармалы рейтинг және қосымша Біз алдын- ала бірнеше тіл үлгісін келтіру керек параллел оқыту деректерін 80% жылдамдығына жеткізу үшін қысқарту керек. Бұл әдістердің ең жақсы жасау үлгісі татоебадағы 112 тілден 83,7% екі мәтіннің дұрыстығын жеткізу үлгісін жасайды, және LASER жеткізген 65,5% ден артық болады, бір-бір тілді аудару оқыту бақыттарында әзірледі. Жақсы үлгілерімізді қолдану үшін CommonCrawl-ден алдындағы параллель деректер en-zh және en-de үлгілер үшін NMT үлгілерін оқыту үшін көрсетіледі. Біз көпшілікті 109+ тілдер үшін ең жақсы көптіл https://tfhub.', 'lt': 'Nors BERT yra veiksmingas metodas mokytis vienkalbių sakinių įterpimo semantiniam panašumui ir įterpti pagrįstą perkėlimo mokymąsi į BERT pagrįstus tarpkalbinius sakinius įterpimo dar nėra išnagrinėta. We systematically investigate methods for learning multilingual sentence embeddings by combining the best methods for learning monolingual and cross-lingual representations including: masked language modeling (MLM), translation language modeling (TLM), dual encoder translation ranking, and additive margin softmax.  We show that introducing a pre-trained multilingual language model dramatically reduces the amount of parallel training data required to achieve good performance by 80%.  Composing the best of these methods produces a model that achieves 83.7% bi-text retrieval accuracy over 112 languages on Tatoeba, well above the 65.5% achieved by LASER, while still performing competitively on monolingual transfer learning benchmarks.  Parallel data mined from CommonCrawl using our best model is shown to train competitive NMT models for en-zh and en-de. We publicly release our best multilingual sentence embedding model for 109+ languages at  https://tfhub.', 'ms': 'While BERT is an effective method for learning monolingual sentence embeddings for semantic similarity and embedding based transfer learning BERT based cross-lingual sentence embeddings have yet to be explored.  Kami secara sistematik menyelidiki kaedah untuk mempelajari penerbangan kalimat berbilang bahasa dengan menggabungkan kaedah terbaik untuk mempelajari perwakilan bahasa tunggal dan saling bahasa termasuk: model bahasa bertopeng (MLM), model bahasa terjemahan (TLM), rangkaian terjemahan dua pengekod, dan margin softmax tambahan. We show that introducing a pre-trained multilingual language model dramatically reduces the amount of parallel training data required to achieve good performance by 80%.  Mengkomposisikan kaedah terbaik ini menghasilkan model yang mencapai keperluan pemulihan 83.7% bi-teks lebih dari 112 bahasa di Tatoeba, jauh lebih dari 65.5% yang dicapai oleh LASER, sementara masih berkompetitif pada tanda-tanda pembelajaran pemindahan monobahasa. Parallel data mined from CommonCrawl using our best model is shown to train competitive NMT models for en-zh and en-de. We publicly release our best multilingual sentence embedding model for 109+ languages at  https://tfhub.', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li l-BERT huwa metodu effettiv għat-tagħlim tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi monolingwi għal similarità semantika u l-inkorporazzjoni tat-tagħlim ibbażat fuq it-trasferiment inkorporazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi translingwi bbażati fuq il-BERT għad iridu jiġu esplorati. We systematically investigate methods for learning multilingual sentence embeddings by combining the best methods for learning monolingual and cross-lingual representations including: masked language modeling (MLM), translation language modeling (TLM), dual encoder translation ranking, and additive margin softmax.  We show that introducing a pre-trained multilingual language model dramatically reduces the amount of parallel training data required to achieve good performance by 80%.  Composing the best of these methods produces a model that achieves 83.7% bi-text retrieval accuracy over 112 languages on Tatoeba, well above the 65.5% achieved by LASER, while still performing competitively on monolingual transfer learning benchmarks.  Dejta parallela maħruġa minn CommonCrawl bl-użu tal-aħjar mudell tagħna tintwera li taħriġ mudelli kompetittivi NMT għal en-zh u en-de. https://tfhub.', 'ml': 'ബെര്\u200dട്ടി സെമാന്റിക്ക് സമമാകുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനും ബിര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനമ മോണോളില്\u200d ഭാഷ പഠിക്കുന്നതിനും ക്രിസ്ലില്\u200d ഭാഷ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കും ഏറ്റവും നല്ല രീതികള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനുമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമികമായി അന്വേഷിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട പലില ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് 80 ശതമാനത്തില്\u200d നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെ ഈ രീതികളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും നല്ല രീതികള്\u200d പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d 83.7% ബി ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിന് 112 ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വിശിഷ്ടമായ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ലാസെര്\u200d നേടിയതി നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കമോണ്\u200dക്രൂളില്\u200d നിന്നും മൈനില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പാരാള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ ഡാറ്റാ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ് എ- എംടി മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക്  https://tfhub.', 'mn': 'BERT бол нэг хэл хэлний өгүүлбэрийг сурах үйл ажиллагааны арга юм. БЕРТ-ын үндсэн шилжүүлбэрийн суралцах болон олон хэл хэлний өгүүлбэрийг сурах арга юм. Бид олон хэл хэлний өгүүлбэрийг сурах аргыг систематикийн судалгаагаар нэг хэл болон олон хэл хэлний үзүүлбэрийг сурах хамгийн сайн аргыг нэгтгэхэд хамтран хамтран судалж байна. Мөн: хэл загварын модель (MLM), хөрөнгө хэл загварын модель (TLM), хоёр хэлбэрийн кодчуудын Бид өмнө сургалтын олон хэл загварын загварыг тайлбарлах нь 80%-аар сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргах шаардлагатай параллел дасгал өгөгдлийн хэмжээ багасгаж байна. Эдгээр хамгийн сайн арга загваруудыг бий болгох нь Татоебад 112 хэл дээр 83.7% дунджаар дунджаар авсан загвар гаргадаг. LASER-ын 65.5% дунджаас илүү, одоо хэл хэлний шилжүүлэх суралцах сургалтын багц дээр өрсөлдөө хийдэг. Хамгийн шилдэг загварыг ашиглан CommonCrawl-ээс гаргасан параллель өгөгдлийн санаа нь en-zh болон en-de-д өрсөлдөг NMT загварын загварыг суралцах болно. https://tfhub.', 'no': 'Mens BERT er ein effektiv metode for å læra innbygging av monospråk setningar for semantisk likning og innbygging av basert overføring av BERT-basert krysspråk setningar er enno utforska. Vi undersøker systematisk metodar for å lære innbygging av fleirspråk setningar ved å kombinere dei beste metodane for å lære monospråk og krysspråk representasjonar, inkludert: maskert språk modellering (MLM), omsetjingsmoduling (TLM), dobbelt koderingsranking, og additiv margin softmax. Vi viser at introdusering av ein fleirspråk-modell som er forelært, dramatisk reduserer kor mange parallelle opplæringsdata krevst for å oppnå godt utvikling med 80%. Komponering av best av desse metodane produserer eit modell som oppnår 83,7 % for å henta rettighet over 112 språk på Tatoeba, vel over 65,5 % oppnådd av LASER, mens fortsatt utfører konkurrentivt på læringsbenchmarke for monospråk. Parallel data minert frå CommonCrawl med vår beste modell vert vist til å trene konkurrente NMT-modeller for en-zh og en-de. Vi løyser offentlig vår beste multispråk setningsmodul for 109+ språk på https://tfhub.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy BERT jest skuteczną metodą uczenia się jednojęzycznych osadzeń zdań dla podobieństwa semantycznego i osadzenia opartego na transferowym uczeniu się BERT osadzenia zdań wielojęzycznych należy jeszcze zbadać. Systematycznie badamy metody nauki wielojęzycznych osadzeń zdań, łącząc najlepsze metody nauki reprezentacji jednojęzycznych i wielojęzycznych, w tym: modelowanie języka maskowanego (MLM), modelowanie języka tłumaczeniowego (TLM), ranking tłumaczeń dwóch koderów oraz dodatkowy margin softmax. Pokazujemy, że wprowadzenie wstępnie przeszkolonego wielojęzycznego modelu języka znacznie zmniejsza ilość równoległych danych treningowych wymaganych do osiągnięcia dobrej wydajności o 80%. Skomponowanie najlepszych z tych metod pozwala uzyskać model, który osiąga 83,7% dokładność pobierania dwutekstu ponad 112 języków na Tatoebie, znacznie powyżej 65,5% osiągniętego przez LASER, jednocześnie wykonując konkurencyjne standardy nauki jednojęzycznego transferu. Równoległe dane wydobyte z CommonCrawl przy użyciu naszego najlepszego modelu pokazują, że mogą szkolić konkurencyjne modele NMT dla en-zh i en-de.Publicznie publikujemy nasz najlepszy wielojęzyczny model osadzania zdań dla języków 109+ na stronie internetowej https://tfhub.', 'ro': 'În timp ce BERT este o metodă eficientă de învățare a încorporărilor de propoziții monolingve pentru similitudinea semantică și de încorporare a învățării bazate pe transfer, încorporările de propoziții translingve bazate pe BERT nu au fost încă explorate. Investigăm sistematic metodele de învățare a încorporărilor de propoziții multilingve prin combinarea celor mai bune metode de învățare a reprezentărilor monolingve și cross-lingve, inclusiv: modelarea limbii mascate (MLM), modelarea limbii de traducere (TLM), clasamentul traducerii cu codare dublă și softmax de marjă aditivă. Noi arătăm că introducerea unui model lingvistic multilingv pre-instruit reduce dramatic cantitatea de date de formare paralelă necesară pentru a obține performanțe bune cu 80%. Compoziția celor mai bune dintre aceste metode produce un model care atinge o precizie de recuperare a textului bi-text de 83,7% peste 112 limbi pe Tatoeba, cu mult peste 65,5% obținut de LASER, în timp ce performează competitiv pe criteriile de învățare monolingvă prin transfer. Datele paralele extrase din CommonCrawl folosind cel mai bun model al nostru sunt demonstrate pentru a instrui modele NMT competitive pentru en-zh și en-de. https://tfhub.', 'sr': 'Iako je BERT efikasna metoda za učenje integracije monojezičkih rečenica za semantičku sličnost i uključenje temeljnog učenja premeštaja BERT-a temeljenog preko jezičkih rečenica, još se ne treba istražiti. Sistemski istražujemo metode za učenje multijezičkih rečenica, kombinirajući najbolje metode za učenje monojezičkih i kroz jezičkih predstavljanja, uključujući: maskirani jezički modeling (MLM), prevodni jezik modeling (TLM), dvostruko kodiranje prevoda, i dodatnu maržu softmax. Pokazujemo da uvođenje predobučenog multijezičkog model a dramatično smanjuje količinu paralelnih podataka za obuku potrebnih za ostvarivanje dobrih učinka za 80%. Komponiranje najboljih od tih metoda proizvodi model koji postiže tačnost izveštaja od 83,7% dvoteksta preko 112 jezika na Tatoebi, iznad 65,5% koje je postigao LASER, dok još uvek izvodi konkurentno na standardima za učenje monojezičkih transfer a. Paralelni podaci koji su minerali iz CommonCrawl koristeći naš najbolji model pokazuju se da treniraju konkurentne NMT modele za en-zh i en-de. Publično objavljujemo našu najbolju multijezičku rečenicu, uključujući model za 109+ jezika. https://tfhub.', 'si': 'BERT තමයි එක භාෂාවික වාක්ය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පර අපි පද්ධතියෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරන්න විද්\u200dයාවය ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් වාර්තාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බොහොම විද්\u200dයාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා: මාස්ක් භාෂාවක් මෝඩිලින්ග් (MLM), භාෂාව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මුලින් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරපු විශේෂ භාෂාවක් මොඩේල් එකක් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා දත්ත අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න 80%  මේ විධානයේ හොඳම විධානයක් සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා තාටෝබාදී 112 භාෂාවට 83.7% දෙනෙක් පිළිගත්ත ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා, 65.5% දෙනෙක් වඩා LASER වලින් ලැබෙනවා, ත අපේ හොඳම මොඩල් භාවිතා කරන්න සමාන්\u200dය දත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශය කරන්න පෙන්වන්නේ en-ජි සහ en-de සමාන්\u200dය NMT මොඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරවේශය කරන්න. https://tfhub.', 'so': 'Inta lagu jiro BERT waa qaab faa’iido ah oo ku barashada hadalka afka ee qofka ah oo u dhexeeya isku mid ah iyo habboonaanta waxbarashada ku saleysan barashada luqada ee BERT weli lama baahan doono. Sida xaqiiqada ah ayaannu si qaab ah u baaraynaa qaababka barashada luqada luuqadaha kala duduwan, taasoo ah qaababka ugu wanaagsan ee barashada noocyada luuqadaha iyo luuqadaha kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan muuqashada luuqada maskaxda (MLM), sameynta luuqadda turjumaadda (TLM), tarjumidda labada kooban, iyo marxa dheeraad ah. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in lagu soo bandhiyo muuqashada afka kala duwan ee hore oo lagu tababaray, si horay ah u hoosaystiro tirada waxbarashada isbarbarka ah oo loogu baahan yahay in lagu sameeyo shaqo wanaagsan 80%. Isbardhigta qaababkan ugu wanaagsan waxaa soo saara tusaale ah oo saxda helitaanka qoraalka ee Tatoeba ku gaadha 83.7% oo ku qoran 112 luuqadood oo qoraal ah, si ka badan 65.5% oo LASER ku soo gaadhay, iyadoo weli ku sameynaya qiimaha barashada luuqada ee muuqaalka ah. Macluumaadka lambarka ah ee laga soo bandhigay CommonCrawl isticmaalka noocyada ugu wanaagsan waxaa loo muujiyaa in lagu tababariyo modelalka tartanka ee NMT ee en-zh iyo en-de. Waxaynu bayaan u siinnaa noocyada ugu wanaagsan ee ku qoran qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan ee 109+ luuqadaha ku qoran https://tfhub.', 'sv': 'Medan BERT är en effektiv metod för att lära sig enspråkiga meningsinbäddningar för semantisk likhet och inbäddning baserat överföringsinlärning, har BERT-baserade tvärspråkliga meningsinbäddningar ännu inte utforskats. Vi undersöker systematiskt metoder för att lära sig flerspråkiga meningar genom att kombinera de bästa metoderna för att lära sig enspråkiga och flerspråkiga representationer inklusive: maskerad språkmodellering (MLM), översättningsspråkmodellering (TLM), rankning av översättningar med dubbla kodare och additiv marginalsoftmax. Vi visar att införandet av en färdigutbildad flerspråkig språkmodell dramatiskt minskar mängden parallella träningsdata som krävs för att uppnå bra resultat med 80%. Genom att komponera det bästa av dessa metoder skapas en modell som uppnår 83,7% dubbeltextnoggrannhet över 112 språk på Tatoeba, långt över de 65,5% som uppnåtts med LASER, samtidigt som den fortfarande presterar konkurrenskraftigt på enspråkiga överföringsläranderiktmärken. Parallella data som hämtats från CommonCrawl med hjälp av vår bästa modell har visat sig träna konkurrenskraftiga NMT-modeller för en-zh och en-de. https://tfhub.', 'ta': 'BERT என்பது ஒரு மொழி வாக்கியை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் போது பெர்டி அடிப்படையில் உள்ள மாற்று கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறையாகும் போது பிரெட் சார்ந்த மொழி வாக்க மூடப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பல மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி முதலில் குறிப்பிடுவதை நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் 80% ஆல் நல்ல செயல்பாட்டை அடைய வேண்டி இந்த சிறந்த முறைகளை ஒப்பிடுவதால் மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறது இது தாடோபாவில் 83.7% பி உரை மீட்டெடுக்கும் சரியான மதிப்பை பெறுகிறது, மேலும் LASER ஆல் அடைந்த 65.5% மேலும், ஆனால் ம நாங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தி குறைக்கப்பட்ட அளபுருவின் தரவுகளை ஒரு - zh மற்றும் - de பயிற்சி செய்ய காட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது. 109+ மொழிகளுக்கு சிறந்த பல மொழிக்க https://tfhub.', 'ur': 'While BERT is an effective method for learning monolingual sentence embeddings for semantic similarity and embedding based transfer learning BERT based cross-language sentence embeddings still need to be explored. ہم سیستماتیک طریقے کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ multilingual sentence embeddings کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک زبان کی اور کروس زبان کی تعلیم کے لئے بہترین طریقے کو ترکیب کریں، شامل کریں: ماسک زبان موڈلینگ (MLM), ترجمہ زبان موڈلینگ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک پیش آموزش کی ملتی زبان کی موڈل کی معلوم کرنا 80% کے ذریعہ اچھی فعالیت پہنچانے کے لئے ضرورت کی تعلیم کے مقدار کو کم کرتا ہے۔ یہ سب سے بہترین طریقوں کا جوڑنا ایک موڈل پیدا کرتا ہے جو تاتوئب میں 112 زبانوں سے 83.7% دوزخ کی دقیقیت حاصل کرتا ہے، جو LASER کے ذریعے 65.5% زیادہ ہے، اور اب تک ایک زبان کی ترنسیٹر سیکھنے کے بانچمٹ پر مسابقات کرتا ہے. ہمارے بہترین موڈل کے مطابق کمونٹ کرول سے پارالی ڈیٹا دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ ان-zh اور ان-de کے لئے مطابق NMT موڈل ترین کریں. ہم عمومی طور پر اپنے بہترین multilingual sentence embedding model 109+ زبانوں کے لئے آزاد کریں گے https://tfhub.', 'mk': 'И покрај тоа што БЕРТ е ефикасен метод за учење на монојазични реченици вградени за семантична сличност и вградување базирано на трансферско учење меѓујазични реченици базирани на БЕРТ сé уште не се истражуваат. We systematically investigate methods for learning multilingual sentence embeddings by combining the best methods for learning monolingual and cross-lingual representations including: masked language modeling (MLM), translation language modeling (TLM), dual encoder translation ranking, and additive margin softmax.  We show that introducing a pre-trained multilingual language model dramatically reduces the amount of parallel training data required to achieve good performance by 80%.  Композицијата на најдобрите од овие методи произведува модел кој постигнува прецизност од 83,7 отсто за добивање битекст во однос на 112 јазици на Татоеба, значително над 65,5 отсто постигнати од ЛАСЕР, додека сé уште врши конкурентни резултати за монојазично учење на трансференции Паралелните податоци од CommonCrawl користејќи го нашиот најдобар модел се покажа дека тренираат конкурентни NMT модели за en-zh и en-de. Јавно го објавуваме нашиот најдобар мултијазичен модел за вградување на 109+ јазици на https://tfhub.', 'vi': 'Trong khi BERT là một phương pháp hiệu quả cho việc học những câu chữ chung ngữ để nắm rõ nét giống nhau theo ngữ pháp và nắm bắt dựa trên việc học tập qua ngôn ngữ. BERT chưa được tìm hiểu. Chúng tôi luôn nghiên cứu các phương pháp học ghép câu đa dạng bằng cách kết hợp những phương pháp tốt nhất để học các biểu hiện ngôn ngữ độc và ngôn ngữ khác nhau bao gồm: tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ đeo mặt nạ (MLM), thiết kế ngôn ngữ dịch (TLS), hàm dịch hai mã hóa, và mã số lượng phụ trội mềm. Chúng tôi cho thấy rằng việc tạo ra một mô hình ngôn ngữ đa dạng được đào tạo trước kịch bản sẽ làm giảm tối đa số lượng dữ liệu giáo dục song song cần thiết để đạt được lợi nhuận cao hơn 80. Cách tốt nhất của cách này là một một cách cung cầm chúng tạo tác ghi ghi ghi tài 83.7=ngoài ngôn ngữ 112 trên Tatoeba, được hiệp cao so với lịch kỹ lịch truyền thống làm chung. Kết hợp dữ liệu chiết xuất từ Commonwealth Crawn dùng loại tốt nhất được cho thấy để đào tạo các mẫu NMT cạnh tranh cho en-zhe và en-de. Chúng tôi công khai phát hành kiểu vẽ bản khai loại tốt nhất của 109+ngôn ngữ ở https://tfhub.', 'uz': "BERT o'rganish monolik so'zlarni o'rganish va BERT asosida o'rganishni o'rganish uchun o'zgarishni o'rganish uchun qo'llab-qo'l so'zlarni o'rganish uchun ishlayotgan usul huddi o'rganish mumkin. Biz bir xil tilni o'rganish uchun bir necha so'zlarni o'rganish usullarini tizimda o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish uchun eng yaxshi usullarni o'rganish imkoniyatlarini o'rganish uchun o'rganish imkoniyatlarini tizimda o'rganamiz. Biz o'rganishdan oldin bir tillar modelini o'rganishni o'zgartirish mumkin, 80%-ga yaxshi bajarishga taklif qiladigan parallel trening maʼlumotini kamaytirish mumkin. Ushbu usullarning eng eng eng yuqori usullarni qidirish modeli Tatoeba 83.7% bi-matn olish davomida yaxshi darajaga ega bo'ladi, ammo 65.5% LASER orqali amalga oshirilgan, ammo o o'rganishni o'rganish uchun davomida ishlayapti. Parallel data mined from CommonCrawl using our best model is shown to train competitive NMT models for en-zh and en-de. We publicly release our best multilingual sentence embedding model for 109+ languages at  https://tfhub.", 'hr': 'Iako je BERT učinkovit metod učenja integracije monojezičkih rečenica za semantičku sličnost i uključenje temeljnog učenja prijenosa BERT-a temeljenog preko jezičkih rečenica još se ne smije istražiti. Sistemski istražujemo metode učenja multijezičkih rečenica kombinirajući najbolje metode učenja monojezičkih i cross-jezičkih predstavljanja, uključujući: maskirani jezički modeling (MLM), prevodni jezik modeling (TLM), dvostruku liniju prevoda kodera i dodatnu marginu softmax. Pokazujemo da uvođenje predobučenog multijezičkog model a dramatično smanjuje količinu paralelnih podataka za obuku potrebnih za postizanje dobrih učinka za 80%. Komponiranje najboljih od tih metoda proizvodi model koji postiže tačnost dobivanja od 83,7% dvoteksta preko 112 jezika na Tatoebi, iznad 65,5% koje je postigao LASER, dok još uvijek izvodi konkurentno na standardima učenja monojezičkih transfer a. Paralelni podaci mineralni iz CommonCrawl koristeći naš najbolji model pokazuju se kako bi obučili konkurentne NMT modele za en-zh i en-de. Publično objavljujemo našu najbolju multijezičku rečenicu uključujući model za 109+ jezika na https://tfhub.', 'da': 'Mens BERT er en effektiv metode til at lære ensprogede sætningsindlejringer for semantisk lighed og indlejring baseret overførselsindlæring BERT baseret tværsprogede sætningsindlejringer er endnu ikke blevet undersøgt. Vi undersøger systematisk metoder til at lære flersprogede sætningsindlejringer ved at kombinere de bedste metoder til at lære ensprogede og tværsprogede repræsentationer, herunder: maskeret sprogmodellering (MLM), oversættelsessprogmodellering (TLM), dual encoder oversættelse ranking og additiv margin softmax. Vi viser, at indførelsen af en forududdannet flersproget sprogmodel reducerer mængden af parallelle træningsdata drastisk med 80%. Ved at sammensætte de bedste af disse metoder opnås en model, der opnår 83,7% bi-tekst hentningsnøjagtighed over 112 sprog på Tatoeba, langt over de 65,5% opnåede med LASER, samtidig med at den stadig præsterer konkurrencedygtigt på ensproget overførselsindlæring benchmarks. Parallel data udvundet fra CommonCrawl ved hjælp af vores bedste model vises at træne konkurrencedygtige NMT modeller til en-zh og en-de. https://tfhub.', 'nl': 'Hoewel BERT een effectieve methode is voor het leren van eentalige zinsinbeddingen voor semantische gelijkenis en op het inbedden van gebaseerd transferleren, moet BERT gebaseerde cross-lingual zinsinbeddingen nog worden onderzocht. We onderzoeken systematisch methoden voor het leren van meertalige zinsinsluitingen door de beste methoden te combineren voor het leren van eentalige en meertalige representaties, waaronder: gemaskeerde taalmodellering (MLM), vertaaltaalmodellering (TLM), dubbele coderingsrangorde en additieve marge softmax. We laten zien dat de invoering van een voorgetraind meertalig taalmodel de hoeveelheid parallelle trainingsgegevens die nodig zijn om goede prestaties te bereiken drastisch vermindert met 80%. Het samenstellen van de beste van deze methoden levert een model op dat 83,7% bi-text retrieval nauwkeurigheid bereikt boven 112 talen op Tatoeba, ver boven de 65,5% bereikt door LASER, terwijl het nog steeds concurrerend presteert op monolingual transfer learning benchmarks. Parallelle gegevens uit CommonCrawl met behulp van ons beste model worden getoond om concurrerende NMT modellen te trainen voor en-zh en-de We publiceren publiekelijk ons beste meertalige zinsinbeddingsmodel voor 109+ talen op https://tfhub.', 'bg': 'Докато BERT е ефективен метод за изучаване на едноезични изречения за семантично сходство и вграждане на базата на трансферно обучение BERT базирани на междуезични изречения все още не са проучени. Систематично изследваме методите за изучаване на многоезични вграждания на изречения чрез комбиниране на най-добрите методи за изучаване на едноезични и междуезични изображения, включително: маскирано езиково моделиране (МЛМ), моделиране на езика на превода (МЛМ), класиране на превода с двоен кодер и добавка марж софтмакс. Показваме, че въвеждането на предварително обучен многоезичен езиков модел драстично намалява количеството паралелни данни за обучение, необходими за постигане на добра производителност, с 80%. Композирането на най-добрите от тези методи създава модел, който постига 83,7% двутекстова точност на извличане на повече от 112 езика на Татоеба, много над 65,5% постигнати от Лазера, като същевременно все още се представя конкурентно на моноезичните референтни показатели за трансферно обучение. Паралелните данни, извлечени от най-добрия ни модел, са показани, че обучават конкурентни модели за Публично публикуваме най-добрия ни многоезичен модел за вграждане на изречения за 109+ езика в https://tfhub.', 'id': 'Sementara BERT adalah metode efektif untuk belajar kalimat monobahasa embedding untuk persamaan semantis dan embedding transfer berdasarkan transfer belajar berdasarkan BERT kalimat saling bahasa embedding belum dikeksplorasi. Kami secara sistematis menyelidiki metode untuk mempelajari pembangunan kalimat berbilang bahasa dengan menggabungkan metode terbaik untuk mempelajari representation monobahasa dan saling bahasa termasuk: modeling bahasa bertopeng (MLM), modeling bahasa terjemahan (TLM), ranking terjemahan dua kode, dan margin softmax tambahan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa memperkenalkan model bahasa berbagai bahasa terlatih secara dramatis mengurangi jumlah data pelatihan paralel yang diperlukan untuk mencapai prestasi yang baik dengan 80%. Membuat yang terbaik dari metode ini menghasilkan model yang mencapai akurasi penghasilan dua teks 83,7% lebih dari 112 bahasa di Tatoeba, jauh lebih dari 65,5% yang dicapai oleh LASER, sementara masih berkompetitif pada benchmark pengajaran transfer monobahasa. Data paralel yang ditembak dari CommonCrawl menggunakan model terbaik kami menunjukkan untuk melatih model NMT kompetitif untuk en-zh dan en-de. Kami publik melepaskan kalimat berbilang terbaik kami memasukkan model untuk 109+ bahasa di https://tfhub.', 'fa': 'While BERT is an effective method for learning monolingual sentence embeddings for semantic similarity and embedding based transfer learning BERT based cross-language sentence embeddings still have to be explored. ما سیستم\u200cپذیر روش\u200cها را برای یادگیری جمله\u200cهای زیادی زبان تحقیق می\u200cکنیم با ترکیب بهترین روش\u200cها برای یادگیری نمایش\u200cهای یک زبان و متوسط زبان شامل: مدل\u200cسازی زبان\u200cهای ماسک\u200cشده (MLM), مدل\u200cسازی زبان\u200cهای ترجمه (TLM), رده\u200cسازی دوئولی رمز\u200cسازی ما نشان می دهیم که پیش آموزش مدل زیادی زبان آموزش داده شده به شدت اندازه داده های آموزش متفاوتی که لازم است برای رسیدن به عملکرد خوب به 80 درصد کاهش دهد. ترکیب بهترین از این روش\u200cها یک مدل تولید می\u200cکند که دقیقات دریافت کردن 83.7 درصد دو متن را بیش از 112 زبان Tatoeba می\u200cگیرد، و بیش از 65.5 درصد که توسط LASER به دست آورده است، در حالی که هنوز با رقابت روی برچسب\u200cهای دریافت آموزش یک تک زبان انجام می\u200cدهد. اطلاعات پارالل معدنی از CommonCrawl با استفاده از بهترین مدل ما نشان داده می\u200cشود تا مدل NMT رقابتی را برای en-zh و en-de آموزش دهیم. ما عموما بهترین جمله\u200cی زبان\u200cهای زیادی را برای 109+ زبان\u200cها آزاد می\u200cکنیم. https://tfhub.', 'de': 'Während BERT eine effektive Methode für das Erlernen von einsprachigen Satzbedeckungen für semantische Ähnlichkeit und eingebettetem Transferlernen ist, müssen BERT-basierte sprachübergreifende Satzbedeckungen noch erforscht werden. Wir untersuchen systematisch Methoden zum Erlernen mehrsprachiger Satzbedingungen, indem wir die besten Methoden zum Erlernen ein- und mehrsprachiger Repräsentationen kombinieren, darunter: maskierte Sprachmodellierung (MLM), Translation Language Modeling (TLM), Dual Encoder Translation Ranking und additive Margin Softmax. Wir zeigen, dass die Einführung eines vortrainierten mehrsprachigen Sprachmodells die Menge an parallelen Trainingsdaten, die für eine gute Leistung benötigt werden, um 80%. Durch die Zusammenstellung der besten dieser Methoden ergibt sich ein Modell, das 83,7% Bitext Retrieval Genauigkeit über 112-Sprachen auf Tatoeba erreicht, deutlich über 65,5% erreicht durch LASER, während es dennoch wettbewerbsfähig auf einsprachigen Transfer Learning Benchmarks ist. Parallele Daten, die aus CommonCrawl mit unserem besten Modell gewonnen wurden, zeigen, dass sie wettbewerbsfähige NMT-Modelle für en-zh und en-de trainieren. https://tfhub.', 'ko': '그러나 의미의 유사성과 삽입을 바탕으로 하는 이동 학습으로 인해 BERT를 바탕으로 하는 다중 언어 문장의 삽입은 아직 탐색이 필요하기 때문에 BERT는 단어 문장의 삽입을 배우는 효과적인 방법이다.우리는 복면 언어 모델링(MLM), 번역 언어 모델링(TLM), 더블 인코더 번역 순위와 가성 간격softmax를 포함한 다중 언어 문장 삽입 방법을 결합하여 체계적으로 연구했다.우리는 사전에 훈련된 다언어 언어 모델을 도입하면 80%의 병행 훈련 데이터량을 현저하게 줄여 좋은 성능을 실현할 수 있음을 나타낸다.이러한 방법 중 가장 좋은 방법을 종합하면 이 모델은 Tatoeba의 112개 언어에서 83.7%의 이중 텍스트 검색 정확도를 실현했고 레이저가 실현한 65.5%보다 훨씬 높았으며 단어 이동 학습 기준에서도 경쟁력을 가진다.Common Crawl에서 가장 좋은 모델을 사용하여 발굴한 병렬 데이터에 의하면 enzh와 en-de를 위해 경쟁력 있는 NMT 모델을 훈련할 수 있습니다.https://tfhub.', 'sw': 'Wakati BERT ni njia yenye ufanisi wa kujifunza hukumu ya lugha ya kimonoliki inaingia kwa ajili ya usafirishaji wa kimapenzi na kuingia kwenye mfumo wa kujifunza kwa lugha yenye msingi wa BERT bado bado haujachunguzwa. Tunafuta mbinu za kujifunza hukumu ya lugha mbalimbali kwa kuunganisha njia nzuri za kujifunza uwakilizaji wa lugha na lugha tofauti ikiwa ni pamoja na: muundo wa lugha za kiutafsiri (MLM), mfano wa lugha ya kutafsiri (TLM), tafsiri ya lugha mbili za kutafsiri, na mfumo wa programu za viungo vya kuongeza. Tunaonyesha kuwa kuanzisha muundo wa lugha ya awali ulioendeshwa kwa lugha mbalimbali unapunguza kiasi cha taarifa za mafunzo yanayohitajika ili kufikia ufanisi mzuri kwa asilimia 80. Kukulinganisha njia nzuri zaidi ya hizi inatengeneza mtindo ambao unafanikiwa kufikia asilimia 83.7 kwa asilimia 112 kwa lugha 112 kwenye Tatoeba, na zaidi ya asilimia 65.5 zilizofanikiwa na LASER, wakati bado wanafanya ushindani katika misingi ya kujifunza kwa lugha za kiuchumi. Takwimu za Parallel zilizopungua kutoka CommonCrawl kwa kutumia mifano yetu bora inaonyesha kufundisha mifano ya NMT ya ushindani kwa ajili ya en-zh na moja-de. https://tfhub.', 'sq': 'Ndërsa BERT është një metodë efektive për mësimin e shtypjeve monogjuhësore për ngjashmëri semantike dhe përfshirjen e shtypjeve transferuese të bazuara në BERT janë ende për të eksploruar. Ne hetojmë sistematikisht metodat për mësimin e përfshirjeve të fjalëve shumëgjuhësore duke kombinuar metodat më të mira për mësimin e përfaqësimeve monogjuhësore dhe ndërgjuhësore duke përfshirë: modelimin e gjuhës së maskuar (MLM), modelimin e gjuhës së përkthimit (TLM), renditjen e përkthimit të dy koduesve dhe marginin shtesë softmax. Ne tregojmë se futja e një modeli të paratrajnuar gjuhësh shumëgjuhësore redukton dramatikisht sasinë e të dhënave paralele të trajnimit të kërkuar për të arritur performancë të mirë me 80%. Përbërja e metodave më të mira prodhon një model që arrin 83.7% saktësinë e marrjes së dy-teksteve mbi 112 gjuhë në Tatoeba, shumë më tepër se 65.5% të arritur nga LASER, ndërsa ende kryen konkurencë në pikat e mësimit monogjuhësor të transferit. Parallel data mined from CommonCrawl using our best model is shown to train competitive NMT models for en-zh and en-de. We publicly release our best multilingual sentence embedding model for 109+ languages at  https://tfhub.', 'af': "Terwyl BERT 'n effektief metode is vir die leer van monolinglike setinge inbettings vir semantiese gelykenis en inbetering van gebaseerde oordrag onderwerp BERT gebaseerde kruistale setinge inbettings nog moet wees uitgevra. Ons het sistematiese metodes ondersoek om multilinglike setinge te leer deur die beste metodes vir die leer van monolinglike en kruistale voorstellings te kombinieer, insluitend: maskeerde taal modellering (MLM), vertaling taal modellering (TLM), dubbel enkoder vertaling, en additiewe marjin softmax. Ons wys dat 'n voorafgeleerde multitale taal model dramatiek die hoeveelheid parallele onderwerp data wat benodig is om goeie prestasie te bereik deur 80% te verminder. Komposisie van die beste van hierdie metodes produseer 'n model wat 83.7% bi-teks ontvang waarskynlik oor 112 taal op Tatoeba bereik word, goed bo die 65.5% wat deur LASER bereik is, terwyl nog samekomstig uitvoer op monolinglike oordragsbankers. Parallele data mining van CommonCrawl gebruik ons beste model is vertoon om konkurreektiewe NMT modele te tref vir en-zh en en-de. Ons openlik verlos ons beste multitaalse seting inbêding model vir 109+ tale op https://tfhub.", 'tr': "BERT semantik meňzeşligi üçin monodil sözleri öwrenmek üçin etkinlik täsirli bir täsirli däldir we BERT'a tabanly çarpaz dil sözleri baglanmak üçin esasy taýýarlanmak üçin bir täsirli sözler bar. Biz sistematik görnüş diller içinde çoklu diller sözlerini öwrenmek üçin gözəl yöntemleri monodil we çoklu diller öwrenmek üçin birleştirip, maskeli diller modellendirmek (MLM), terjime dilleri modellendirmek (TLM), iki ködler terjime düzümlerini we ekleýän terjime düzümlerini birleştirmekde. Biz öňünden öňünden eğitilen bir multi dil nusgasyny 80%-a seretsek üçin gerekli parallel eğitim maglumatynyň azalygyny görkeýäris. Bu yönleriň iň gowysyny ýazmak üçin Tatoeba'da 83.7% köp tekst dilinde 112 dilinde gatnaşmak üçin bir nusga bar we LASER tarapyndan ýetip bolan 65.5% üstinde we heniz hem monodil transfers öwrenmek nişanlarynda ýaryşykly ýöreýär. CommonCrawl tarapyndan mynanýan parallel maglumatlar biziň iň gowy nusgymyz bilen en-zh we en-de döwletleşli NMT modellerini öwretmek üçin görkezilýär. 109+ diller üçin iň gowy multi dilli sözlemlerimizi publika taýýarlaýarys https://tfhub.", 'am': 'BERT የሞላዊ ቋንቋ ቃላት ለsemantic ብጤት ለመማር እና የBERT የተሰኘ የልዩ ቋንቋ ቃላት መማር የሚደረገውን መቀናቀል ግን ገና አይመረምርም፡፡ የብዙ ቋንቋ ቃላትን ለመማር የሚሻሉትን የልዩ ቋንቋዎች እና የልዩ ቋንቋዎች መልዕክቶች ለመማር ጥናት በተስማምረን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ከዚህ በፊት የተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሞዴል በመግለጫው በ80 በመቶ የሚያስፈልገውን የተማሪዎች ዳታዎችን የሚያጎድልበት እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም ደረጃዎች የተሻለጠውን ማሳየት 83.7 በመቶ ቢ-ጽሑፍ ማድረግ በአሥራ 112 ቋንቋዎች ላይ የሚያገኘውን ምሳሌ አቀረበ፤ ከ65.5 በመቶው በመቶው በተደረገው LASER የሚደረገውን እና ገናም በሞሎልቋንቋ ለመማር መክፈቻን የሚችል ክፍል ነው፡፡ Parallel data mined from CommonCrawl using our best model is shown to train competitive NMT models for en-zh and en-de. We publicly release our best multilingual sentence embedding model for 109+ languages at  https://tfhub.', 'bn': 'এদিকে বিবের্ট একটি কার্যকর পদ্ধতি যা অর্থনৈতিক বাক্য শিক্ষা প্রদান করা হয়েছে সেমান্টিক সমতা এবং ভিত্তিক পরিবর্তনের জন্য বিবের্ট ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্ত আমরা সিস্টেমিকভাবে অনুসন্ধান করি বহুভাষায় বাক্য শিক্ষা প্রদানের মাধ্যমে অনুসন্ধানের মাধ্যমে অনুসন্ধানের মাধ্যমে অনুসন্ধান করি মোশাক ভাষা মডেল (এমএলএম), অনুবাদ ভাষার মডেল (টিএল আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত একটি বহুভাষাভাষী মডেল প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যাতে ৮০ শতাংশ ভালো প্রদর্শনের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় প্রশিক্ষণের এগুলোর সবচেয়ে ভালো পদ্ধতি তুলে ধরা একটি মডেল তৈরি করে যা তাতোয়েবাতে ৮৩. আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভাল মডেল ব্যবহার করে কমোনক্রাউল থেকে পারালেলের তথ্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে প্রতিযোগিতায় এনএমটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ দেয়া হয়েছে যে আমরা প্রকাশ্য https://tfhub.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ BER-ը մեկլեզու նախադասությունների ուսումնասիրության արդյունավետ մեթոդ է, որը ներառում է սեմանտիկ նմանության և ներառում է BER-ի հիմնված փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության հիմնված փոխլեզու նախադասությունների ներառումները դեռևս պետք է ուսումնասիրել: Մենք համակարգչաբար ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմալեզու նախադասությունների ներդրման ուսումնասիրության մեթոդները միավորելով միալեզու և երկլեզու ներկայացումների ուսումնասիրության լավագույն մեթոդները, ներառյալ՝ պատկերված լեզվի մոդելը (MLM), թարգմանման լեզվի մոդելը (TLM), երկու կոդեր թարգմանման դասա We show that introducing a pre-trained multilingual language model dramatically reduces the amount of parallel training data required to achieve good performance by 80%.  Այս մեթոդներից լավագույն կառուցվածքը ստեղծում է մի մոդել, որը հասնում է Թաթոեբայի 112 լեզուների հետ կապված 82.7 տոկոսի երկլեզվի ճշմարտությունը, շատ ավելի քան LASER 65.5 տոկոսը, մինչդեռ մրցակցություն ունի միալեզվի փոխանցման ուսումնական հարաբերակների վրա: Պարզվում է, որ համեմատական տվյալները, որոնք հանվել են Common Crawle-ից օգտագործելով մեր լավագույն մոդելը, մրցակցություն են տալիս NMT-ի մրցակցության մոդելներին en-z և en-de-ի համար։ Մենք հանրային առումով հրապարակում ենք մեր լավագույն բազլեզու նա https://tfhub.', 'az': "BERT, semantik bənzər sözləri öyrənmək və BERT tabanlı öyrənmək öyrənmək üçün çox dilli cümlələr inşallarını öyrənmək üçün effektiv bir yoldur. Biz çoxlu dil cümlələrini öyrənmək üçün sistematik təhsil edirik, monodil və çoxlu dil təsirlərini öyrənmək üçün ən yaxşı metodları birləşdiririk: masked dil modelling (MLM), tercümə dili modelli (TLM), dual koder tercümə rəngli, və additive margin softmax. Biz göstəririk ki, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş çoxlu dil modelini göstərmək 80% ilə yaxşı təhsil etmək üçün lazım olan paralel təhsil məlumatlarının dəyişdirilməsini dramatik olaraq azaldır. Bu metodların ən yaxşısını birləşdirmək, Tatoeba'da 112 dilində 83.7% iki metin alınması ədaləti olaraq, LASER tarafından gələn 65.5%-dən üstün, hələ də monodil transfer öyrənməsi benchmarklərində mübahisə edir. Ən yaxşı modellərimizi istifadə edərək CommonCrawl tərəfindən alan parallel verilər en-zh və en-de üçün münafiqli NMT modellərini təhsil etmək üçün göstərildir. Biz insanlara 109+ dillərin ən yaxşı çoxlu dilli cümlələrimizi yayındırırıq. https://tfhub.", 'bs': 'Iako je BERT efikasna metoda za učenje integracije monojezičkih rečenica za semantičku sličnost i uključenje temeljnog učenja premještaja BERT-a temeljenog preko jezičkih rečenica još se ne smije istražiti. Sistemski istražujemo metode za učenje integracije multijezičkih rečenica kombinirajući najbolje metode za učenje monojezičkih i cross-jezičkih predstavljanja, uključujući: maskirani jezički modeling (MLM), prevodni jezik modeling (TLM), dvostruku liniju prevodnog kodera i dodatnu marginu softmax. Pokazujemo da uvođenje predobučenog multijezičkog model a dramatično smanjuje količinu paralelnih podataka za obuku potrebnih za ostvarivanje dobrih učinka za 80%. Komponiranje najboljih od tih metoda proizvodi model koji postiže tačnost izveštaja od 83,7% dvoteksta preko 112 jezika na Tatoebi, iznad 65,5% koje je postigao LASER, dok još uvijek izvodi konkurentno na standardima učenja monojezičkih transfer a. Paralelni podaci mineralni iz CommonCrawl koristeći naš najbolji model pokazuju se da treniraju konkurentne NMT modele za en-zh i en-de. Publično objavljujemo našu najbolju multijezičku rečenicu, uključujući model za 109+ jezika. https://tfhub.', 'ca': "Mentre que BERT és un mètode efectiu per aprendre frases monolingües incorporades per similitud semàntica i incorporar l'aprenentatge basat en transfer ències incorporades frases translingües basades en BERT encara no s'han explorat. Investiguem sistemàticament mètodes d'aprenentatge d'incorporacions de frases multilingües combinant els millors mètodes d'aprenentatge de representacions monolingües i translingües, incloent: modelació mascada de llenguatges (MLM), modelació de llenguatges de traducció (TLM), classificació de traducció de doble codificador, i marge adicional softmax. Mostrem que la introducció d'un model de llenguatge multillenguatge pré-entrenat redueix dramàticament la quantitat de dades de formació paralleles requerides per aconseguir un 80%. Composing the best of these methods produces a model that achieves 83.7% bi-text retrieval accuracy over 112 languages on Tatoeba, well above the 65.5% achieved by LASER, while still performing competitively on monolingual transfer learning benchmarks.  Es demostra que les dades parallels extraïdes de CommonCrawl utilitzant el nostre millor model entrenen models NMT competitius per en-zh i en-de. https://tfhub.", 'fi': 'Vaikka BERT on tehokas tapa oppia monikielisiä lauseiden upotuksia semanttisen samankaltaisuuden ja upotuspohjaisen siirtooppimisen kannalta, BERT-pohjaisia monikielisiä lauseiden upotuksia ei ole vielä tutkittu. Tutkimme systemaattisesti menetelmiä monikielisten lauseiden upottamisen oppimiseen yhdistämällä parhaat menetelmät yhden- ja monikielisten esitysten oppimiseen, mukaan lukien: masked language modelling (MLM), käännöskielen mallinnus (TLM), kaksoiskooderin käännösrajoitus ja additive margin softmax. Osoitamme, että esikoulutetun monikielisen kielimallin käyttöönotto vähentää huomattavasti rinnakkaisten koulutustietojen määrää hyvän suorituskyvyn saavuttamiseksi 80%. Parhaan menetelmän muodostaminen tuottaa mallin, joka saavuttaa 83,7% kahden tekstin haun tarkkuuden yli 112 kielellä Tatoeba, selvästi yli 65,5% LASER-menetelmällä, mutta silti kilpailee monikielisen siirtooppimisen vertailuarvoissa. CommonCrawlista parhaalla mallillamme louhittu rinnakkaisaineisto opettaa kilpailevia NMT-malleja en-zh- ja en-de-kielelle. Julkaisemme julkisesti parhaan monikielisen lauseiden upotusmallin yli 109 kielelle osoitteessa https://tfhub.', 'et': 'Kuigi BERT on tõhus meetod ühekeelsete lausete manustamiseks semantilise sarnasuse ja manustamispõhise siirdeõppe jaoks, on BERT-põhiseid lausepõhiseid manustamisi veel uurimata. Me uurime süstemaatiliselt mitmekeelsete lausete manustamise õppimise meetodeid, kombineerides parimaid meetodeid ühe- ja keeleüleste representatsioonide õppimiseks, sealhulgas: maskeeritud keele modelleerimine (MLM), tõlkekeele modelleerimine (TLM), topeltkodeerija tõlke järjestus ja lisamarginaal softmax. Näitame, et eelnevalt koolitatud mitmekeelse keelemudeli kasutuselevõtt vähendab oluliselt hea tulemuse saavutamiseks vajalike paralleelsete koolitusandmete hulka 80%. Parimate meetodite koostamine toob mudeli, mis saavutab Tatoeba 112 keele kaheteksti tagasivõtmise täpsuse 83,7%, mis on tunduvalt suurem kui LASER-iga saavutatud 65,5%, samas kui ühekeelse siirdeõppe võrdlusnäitajate osas konkurentsivõimeline. Meie parimat mudelit kasutades CommonCrawlist kaevandatud paralleelsed andmed on näidatud, et koolitada konkurentsivõimelisi NMT mudeleid en-zh ja en-de jaoks. https://tfhub.', 'cs': 'Zatímco BERT je efektivní metoda pro učení se vložení jednojjazyčných vět pro sémantickou podobnost a vložení založené na transferovém učení BERT založené na vložení vět mezi jazyčnými. Systematicky zkoumáme metody pro výuku vícejazyčných vět vložením kombinací nejlepších metod pro učení se jednojjazyčných a vícejazyčných reprezentací, včetně: maskovaného jazykového modelování (MLM), modelování překladového jazyka (TLM), hodnocení překladu duálního kodéru a aditivního softmaxu margin. Ukázali jsme, že zavedení předškoleného vícejazyčného jazykového modelu dramaticky snižuje množství paralelních dat potřebných k dosažení dobrého výkonu o 80%. Skládání nejlepších z těchto metod vytváří model, který dosahuje 83,7% přesnosti vyhledávání bi-textu přes 112 jazyky Tatoeba, výrazně nad 65,5% dosažené LASER, přičemž stále vykonává konkurenční hodnoty pro monojazyčné transferové učení. Paralelní data vytěžená z CommonCrawlu pomocí našeho nejlepšího modelu jsou ukázána pro trénink konkurenčních NMT modelů pro en-zh a en-de. https://tfhub.', 'sk': 'Čeprav je BERT učinkovita metoda za učenje enojezičnih stavkov za semantično podobnost in prenosno učenje na podlagi vgradnje, je treba raziskati tudi medjezične stavke, ki temeljijo na BERT. Sistematično raziskujemo metode učenja večjezičnih vdelav stavkov z združevanjem najboljših metod učenja enojezičnih in medjezičnih predstavitev, vključno z: masked language modeling (MLM), prevajalskim jezikom (TLM), dvojnim kodirnim prevajanjem in aditive margin softmax. Pokazali smo, da uvedba vnaprej usposobljenega večjezičnega jezikovnega modela dramatično zmanjša količino podatkov o vzporednem usposabljanju, potrebnih za doseganje dobre uspešnosti, za 80%. S sestavljanjem najboljših teh metod se na Tatoebi doseže 83,7-odstotna natančnost pridobivanja dveh besedil v več kot 112 jezikih, kar je precej nad 65,5-odstotno natančnostjo pridobivanja z LASER-om, medtem ko še vedno konkurenčno deluje na enojezičnih merilih transfernega učenja. Vzporedni podatki, pridobljeni iz CommonCrawla z uporabo našega najboljšega modela, so prikazani za usposabljanje konkurenčnih NMT modelov za en-zh in en-de. https://tfhub.', 'he': 'בעוד BERT הוא שיטה יעילה ללמוד משפטים מונושפתיים תוספות לדמיון סמנטי ותקף משפטים מובססים ללמוד העברה על בסיס BERT עדיין לא ניתן לחקור. אנו חוקרים באופן שיטתי שיטות ללמוד תוספות משפטים רבות שפות על ידי שילוב השיטות הטובות ביותר ללמוד מייצגים חד-שפותיים וחצות שפותיים כולל: מודל שפת מסוכן (MLM), מודל שפת תרגום (TLM), מייצג תרגום כפול קודם, וסופטמאקס גבול מוסיף. אנחנו מראים שההצגת מודל שפה רבת-שפות מאומן מראש מפחידה באופן דרמטי את כמות נתוני אימון מקביל שנדרש כדי להשיג ביצועים טובים ב-80%. המרכיב הטוב ביותר מהשיטות האלה יוצר דוגמא שמשגת מדויקת השיגור ביטקסט של 83.7% מעל 112 שפות על טטובה, הרבה מעל 65.5% שנשגה על ידי LASER, בעוד עדיין מופיע בתחרות על נקודות מדויקת ההעברה מונולשונות. נתונים parallels מוכרים מ CommonCrawl בשימוש המודל הטוב ביותר שלנו מופיעים כדי לאמן מודלים NMT תחרותיים עבור en-zh ו en-de. אנו פורסמים בפומבי את המשפט המיוחד הטוב ביותר שלנו https://tfhub.', 'ha': "Alhãli kuwa BERT yana da wata hanyoyi mai amfani ga karanta cewa ɗin ayuka da aka shigar da shi zuwa semantin sifatida kuma a lokacin shifo da aka sanar da shi a bakin maganar bakin BERT, kuma ba za a yi ƙidãya ba. Tuna yin ƙidãya a cikin shirin karanta maganar mulki-lingui da ke cikin shirin su sami da shiryoyin mafiya kyau wa lõkaci na masu ƙaranci da linguin-na-ɗabi'a, kamar misalin misalin harshe da aka rufe (MLM), misalin harshen fassarar (TLM), fassarori na dual kode da kuma matsalar margin na ƙaranci. Tuna nũna cewa, ana ƙara kodi da tsarin mutane da aka yi amfani da shi a gaba-wa'anar mulki-lingui, yana ƙaranci da gwargwadon data da za'a yi amfani da shi da 80%. Aka daidaita mafi kyaun hanyõyin waɗannan, yana fitar da wata motsi wanda ke sãmun tsari na matsayin 83.7% da ke cika tsari na rubutun na rubutun Tatoeba, da kuma mafi girma daga asilimin 65.5 wanda aka samar da kuma a lokacin suna yin gaugawa a kan muhimmin transfer na monoli-language. Ana nuna data masu ƙaranci daga Commoncrawl da ke amfani da misalinmu mafi kyau a nuna wa kõre misãlai na NMT masu yin competiti wa en-zh da en-de. Tuna saka da bayana masu kyaun maganar mulki-lingui wanda ke shigar da misalin 109+ harshen zuwa https://tfhub.", 'jv': 'BERT iku adalah sistem sing efek nggambar sistem penting Monlanguage Tulung Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo akeh modèl multilenguang langgambar, dadi kapan langgambar nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe geratan surat kanggo ngerasakno operasi luwih saben % Ngubah bener sing paling dhéwé kuwi nggawe modèl sing bisa nggawe tatag-ingkang Paralele data mined menyang katya kompanie https://tfhub.', 'bo': 'BERT (BERT)ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གཅིག་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རེད། We systematically investigate methods for learning multilingual sentence embeddings by combining the best methods for learning monolingual and cross-lingual representations including: masked language modeling (MLM), translation language modeling (TLM), dual encoder translation ranking, and additive margin softmax. ང་ཚོས་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྔོན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འགྲོ་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག Composing the best of these methods produces a model that achieves 83.7% by-text retrieval accuracy over 112 languages on Tatoeba, well above the 65.5% achieved by LASER, while still performing competitively on monolingual transfer learning benchmarks. Parallel data mined from the CommonCrawl using our best model is shown to train competitive NMT models for en-zh and en-de. We publicly release our best multilingual sentence embedding model for 109+ languages at https://tfhub.'}
{'en': 'Generative Pretraining for Paraphrase Evaluation', 'ar': 'التعرف على الكيانات المسماة المتداخلة مع الرسوم البيانية على مستوى الامتداد', 'pt': 'Reconhecimento de entidade nomeada aninhada com gráficos em nível de extensão', 'es': 'Reconocimiento de entidades nombradas anidadas con gráficos a nivel de span', 'fr': "Reconnaissance d'entités nommées imbriquées avec des graphes au niveau de l'étendue", 'ja': 'スパンレベルのグラフを使用したネストされた名前付きエンティティの認識', 'zh': '有跨度级图形者嵌套名实体识之', 'hi': 'स्पैन-स्तर ग्राफ़ के साथ नेस्टेड नामित एंटिटी पहचान', 'ru': 'Вложенное распознавание именованных сущностей с графами уровня Span', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe Neadaithe le Graif ar leibhéal Réise', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση ένθετης Οντότητας με γραφήματα επιπέδου διαστάσεων', 'hu': 'Egyesbe ágyazott elnevezett szervezetek felismerése Span-szintű grafikonokkal', 'ka': 'სახელი სახელი ინტერტის განაცნობა Span- დრაფის გრაფიებით', 'it': 'Riconoscimento di entità con nome annidato con grafici a livello di span', 'kk': 'Спан деңгейіндегі графиктермен аталған нысандарды анықтау', 'mk': 'Nested Named Entity Recognition with Span-level Graphs', 'lt': 'Nested Named Entity Recognition with Span-level Graphs', 'ml': 'സ്പാന്\u200d നില ഗ്രാഫ്', 'mn': 'Спан түвшинд нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition with Span-Level Graphs', 'mt': 'Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Imniżżla f’Nest b’Graffi tal-Livell Span', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Entiti bernama Nested dengan Graf Aras-Span', 'no': 'Følgjande gjenkjenning av namnet entitet med spannnivågrafikk', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie nazw zagnieżdżonych podmiotów z wykresami poziomu rozpiętości', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea entităților cu nume înnoite cu grafice la nivel de span', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih podataka sa španskim grafama na nivou', 'so': 'Nested Entity Recognition with Span-level Graphs', 'sv': 'Nested Named Entity Recognition with Span-level Graphs', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Span- level Graphs', 'ur': 'Span-level Graphs کے ساتھ نیٹ نام کی اینٹیٹی پہچان', 'uz': 'Ispan- level Graphs bilan aniqlash', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Разпознаване на гнездено наименовани обекти с графики на ниво обхват', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih podataka s grafama na razini spana', 'de': 'Verschachtelte Erkennung benannter Entitäten mit Diagrammen auf Spannebene', 'da': 'Indlejret navngivet enhedsgenkendelse med diagrammer på spanniveau', 'id': 'Pengenalan Entitas Nama Tersarang dengan Graf Tingkat Span', 'nl': 'Geneste naamsbekendheid met grafieken op spanniveau', 'tr': 'Aýry Aýry Gaýd Edilmiş Otlary', 'sw': 'Tambulisho la Entity with Span-level Graphs', 'fa': 'شناسایی عنصر نام با گرافهای سطح اسپانیا', 'ko': '크로스맵 기반 플러그인 이름 실체 식별', 'af': 'Gebruiker Gebruiker Eenheidherkening met Span- vlak Grafies', 'am': 'ReplyForward', 'sq': 'Njohja e njësisë së emëruar me nivel Span', 'hy': 'Սպունտային մակարդակի գրաֆիկներով', 'az': 'ńįspanya s…ôviyy…ôsi Grafikl…ôri il…ô AdlńĪ Entity Recognition', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanog entiteta sa grafom na nivou spana', 'bn': 'স্প্যান- স্তরের গ্রাফের সাথে নাম নির্বাচিত এন্টিটি পরিচিতি', 'ca': "Recognició d'Entitats Nomades Nested amb Gràfics de nivell espanyol", 'cs': 'Vnořené rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit s grafy na úrovni rozpětí', 'et': 'Pesistatud nimega ettevõtte tuvastamine ulatuse taseme graafikutega', 'fi': 'Siirrettyjen nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistus Span-tason kaavioilla', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje gnezdenih imen subjektov z grafikoni na ravni razpona', 'he': 'זיהוי יחידה בשם הקרקע עם גרפים ברמה ספנס', 'bo': 'ཟིན་བྲིས་ཀྱི་སྐུད་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་པ'}
{'en': 'We introduce ParaBLEU a paraphrase representation learning model and evaluation metric for text generation Unlike previous approaches ParaBLEU learns to understand paraphrasis using generative conditioning as a pretraining objective ParaBLEU correlates more strongly with human judgements than existing metrics obtaining new state of the art results on the WMT Metrics Shared Task We show that our model is robust to data scarcity exceeding previous state of the art performance using only 50\\%$ of the available training data and surpassing BLEU ROUGE and METEOR with only labelled examples Finally we demonstrate that ParaBLEU can be used to conditionally generate novel paraphrases from a single demonstration which we use to confirm our hypothesis that it learns abstract generalized paraphrase representations', 'ar': 'تتمتع الطرق المستندة إلى Span مع العمود الفقري للشبكات العصبية بإمكانيات كبيرة لمشكلة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة المتداخلة (NER). ومع ذلك ، فإنهم يواجهون مشاكل مثل الانحطاط عندما تتداخل الأمثلة الإيجابية والسلبية إلى حد كبير. إلى جانب ذلك ، فإن قدرة التعميم مهمة كثيرًا في NER المتداخلة ، حيث لا تظهر نسبة كبيرة من الكيانات في مجموعة الاختبار في مجموعة التدريب. في هذا العمل ، نحاول تحسين تمثيل النطاق من خلال استخدام الرسوم البيانية على مستوى الامتداد المستندة إلى الاسترداد ، وربط الامتدادات والكيانات في بيانات التدريب بناءً على ميزات $ n $ -gram. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم ببناء الرسم البياني للكيان والكيان والرسم البياني للكيان الممتد عالميًا استنادًا إلى تشابه $ n $ -gram لدمج معلومات الكيانات المجاورة المماثلة في تمثيل النطاق. لتقييم طريقتنا ، نجري تجارب على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات NER متداخلة مشتركة ، ACE2004 ، ACE2005 ، ومجموعات بيانات GENIA. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تحقق تحسينات عامة على جميع المعايير الثلاثة (+ 0.30 دولار / سيم 0.85 دولارًا صغيرًا- F1) ، وتحصل على تفوق خاص على الكيانات منخفضة التردد (+ 0.56 دولار \\ sim 2.08 دولار استدعاء).', 'es': 'Los métodos basados en span con la red troncal de las redes neuronales tienen un gran potencial para el problema del reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) anidadas. Sin embargo, se enfrentan a problemas como la degeneración cuando las instancias positivas y las negativas se superponen en gran medida. Además, la capacidad de generalización es muy importante en la NER anidada, ya que una gran proporción de entidades del conjunto de pruebas apenas aparecen en el conjunto de entrenamiento. En este trabajo, tratamos de mejorar la representación de span mediante el uso de gráficos de nivel de span basados en recuperación, conectando tramos y entidades en los datos de entrenamiento en función de las características de $n$-gram. Específicamente, creamos el gráfico entity-entity y el gráfico span-entity globalmente en función de la similitud de $n$-gram para integrar la información de entidades vecinas similares en la representación de span. Para evaluar nuestro método, realizamos experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos de NER anidados comunes, ACE2004, ACE2005 y GENIA. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro método logra mejoras generales en los tres puntos de referencia (+$0.30\\ sim 0.85$ micro-F1), y obtiene una superioridad especial en entidades de baja frecuencia (+$0.56\\ sim 2.08$ retirada).', 'fr': "Les méthodes basées sur SPAN avec le backbone des réseaux de neurones présentent un grand potentiel pour le problème de la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) imbriquées. Cependant, ils sont confrontés à des problèmes tels que la dégénérescence lorsque les cas positifs et les cas négatifs se chevauchent largement. En outre, la capacité de généralisation est très importante dans le NER imbriqué, car une grande proportion d'entités dans l'ensemble de tests apparaissent rarement dans l'ensemble d'entraînement. Dans ce travail, nous essayons d'améliorer la représentation des plages en utilisant des graphiques de niveau d'étendue basés sur la récupération, en connectant les plages et les entités dans les données d'apprentissage en fonction des caractéristiques $n$-gram. Plus précisément, nous construisons le graphe entité-entité et le graphe span-entity globalement en fonction de la similitude $n$-gram pour intégrer les informations d'entités voisines similaires dans la représentation de span. Pour évaluer notre méthode, nous menons des expériences sur trois ensembles de données NER imbriqués courants, ACE2004, ACE2005 et GENIA. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre méthode permet d'obtenir des améliorations générales sur les trois points de référence (+0,30 $\xa0\\ sim 0,85$ micro-F1), et obtient une supériorité spéciale sur les entités basse fréquence (+0,56 $\xa0\\ sim 2,08$ rappel).", 'pt': 'Métodos baseados em span com o backbone de redes neurais têm grande potencial para o problema de reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas aninhadas (NER). No entanto, eles enfrentam problemas como degeneração quando instâncias positivas e negativas se sobrepõem amplamente. Além disso, a habilidade de generalização é muito importante no NER aninhado, pois uma grande proporção de entidades no conjunto de teste dificilmente aparecem no conjunto de treinamento. Neste trabalho, tentamos melhorar a representação de span usando gráficos de nível de span baseados em recuperação, conectando spans e entidades nos dados de treinamento com base em recursos $n$-gram. Especificamente, construímos o gráfico entidade-entidade e o gráfico span-entity globalmente com base na similaridade $n$-gram para integrar as informações de entidades vizinhas semelhantes na representação span. Para avaliar nosso método, realizamos experimentos em três conjuntos de dados NER aninhados comuns, conjuntos de dados ACE2004, ACE2005 e GENIA. Resultados experimentais mostram que nosso método alcança melhorias gerais em todos os três benchmarks (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ micro-F1), e obtém superioridade especial em entidades de baixa frequência (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ recall).', 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークバックボーンを備えたスパンベースの方法は、ネストされた名前付きエンティティ認識（ ＮＥＲ ）問題に大きな可能性を有する。 しかし、ポジティブなインスタンスとネガティブなインスタンスがほとんど重なったときに退化するなどの問題に直面しています。 さらに、テストセットの多くのエンティティがトレーニングセットにほとんど登場しないため、一般化能力は入れ子になったNERで非常に重要です。 この作業では、取得ベースのスパンレベルのグラフを使用し、$ n $- gram機能に基づいてトレーニングデータ内のスパンとエンティティを接続することで、スパン表現を改善しようとします。 具体的には、$ n $-gramの類似性に基づいてグローバルにエンティティ-エンティティグラフとスパン-エンティティグラフを構築し、類似する隣接エンティティの情報をスパン表現に統合します。 私たちの方法を評価するために、私たちは3つの一般的な入れ子になったNERデータセット、ACE 2004、ACE 2005、およびGeniaデータセットの実験を行います。 実験結果は、本方法が3つのベンチマークすべてで一般的な改善を達成し（+$ 0.30\\ sim 0.85 $ micro - F 1 ）、低頻度エンティティで特別な優位性を得ていることを示しています（+$ 0.56\\ sim 2.08 $ recall ）。', 'zh': '有神经网络干之跨度,在嵌套名实(NER)有大潜力。 然当积例消极,其临诸退化。 此外,泛化力在嵌套 NER 中甚重,盖试集大体,殆不见于教集也。 此图因检索跨度级图来改跨度,基于$n$-gram特徵连练跨度实。 盖$n$-gram相似性构实体于全球内-与跨实体图,以比邻之信集跨度。 为评估之法,于三常见之嵌套NER数集上行实验,ACE2004ACE2005GENIA数集。 实验结果表明,该法于三准测试(+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1)上均得总体改进,并于低频体上获殊胜(+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$召还率)。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका नेटवर्क बैकबोन के साथ स्पैन-आधारित विधियों में नेस्टेड नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) समस्या के लिए बड़ी क्षमता है। हालांकि, उन्हें समस्याओं का सामना करना पड़ता है जैसे कि जब सकारात्मक उदाहरण और नकारात्मक उदाहरण काफी हद तक ओवरलैप होते हैं। इसके अलावा, नेस्टेड एनईआर में सामान्यीकरण क्षमता बहुत मायने रखती है, क्योंकि परीक्षण सेट में संस्थाओं का एक बड़ा अनुपात शायद ही प्रशिक्षण सेट में दिखाई देता है। इस काम में, हम पुनर्प्राप्ति-आधारित स्पैन-स्तर के ग्राफ़ का उपयोग करके, $n $ -ग्राम सुविधाओं के आधार पर प्रशिक्षण डेटा में स्पैन और संस्थाओं को जोड़कर स्पैन प्रतिनिधित्व में सुधार करने का प्रयास करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम समान पड़ोसी संस्थाओं की जानकारी को अवधि प्रतिनिधित्व में एकीकृत करने के लिए $n $ -ग्राम समानता के आधार पर वैश्विक स्तर पर इकाई-इकाई ग्राफ और स्पैन-एंटिटी ग्राफ का निर्माण करते हैं। हमारी विधि का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए, हम तीन सामान्य नेस्टेड एनईआर डेटासेट, ACE2004, ACE2005 और GENIA डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि सभी तीन बेंचमार्क (+ $ 0.30 \\sim 0.85 $ माइक्रो-F1) पर सामान्य सुधार प्राप्त करती है, और कम आवृत्ति संस्थाओं (+ $ 0.56 \\sim 2.08 $ recall) पर विशेष श्रेष्ठता प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'Методы, основанные на интервале, с нейронной сетью имеют большой потенциал для задачи распознавания вложенных именованных сущностей (NER). Однако они сталкиваются с такими проблемами, как дегенерация, когда положительные и отрицательные примеры во многом совпадают. Кроме того, способность обобщения имеет большое значение во вложенном NER, так как большая часть сущностей в тестовом наборе едва ли присутствует в обучающем наборе. В этой работе мы стараемся улучшить представление интервала, используя основанные на поиске графы уровня интервала, соединяя интервалы и сущности в обучающих данных на основе $ n$ -граммных признаков. В частности, мы строим граф сущности и граф сущности диапазона глобально на основе сходства $ n$ -грамм, чтобы интегрировать информацию аналогичных соседних сущностей в представление диапазона. Чтобы оценить наш метод, мы проводим эксперименты над тремя общими вложенными наборами данных NER: Ace2004, Ace2005 и GENIA. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод достигает общих улучшений по всем трем реперам (+$ 0,30 \\sim 0,85$ micro-F1), и получает особое превосходство по низкочастотным объектам (+$ 0,56 \\sim 2,08$ отзыв).', 'ga': 'Tá acmhainneacht mhór ag modhanna atá bunaithe ar réise le cnámh droma na líonraí néaracha maidir le fadhb aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe neadaithe (NER). Mar sin féin, bíonn fadhbanna acu amhail meathlú nuair a fhorluíonn cásanna dearfacha agus cásanna diúltacha den chuid is mó. Ina theannta sin, is mór an tábhacht a bhaineann leis an gcumas ginearálaithe i NER neadaithe, mar is ar éigean a bhíonn cuid mhór de na heintitis sa tacar tástála le feiceáil sa tacar oiliúna. San obair seo, déanaimid iarracht an léiriú réise a fheabhsú trí úsáid a bhaint as graif réise-leibhéil atá bunaithe ar aisghabháil, ag nascadh raonta agus aonáin sna sonraí oiliúna bunaithe ar ghnéithe $n$-gram. Go sonrach, tógaimid an graf aonáin-eintiteas agus an graf aonáin réise bunaithe ar chosúlacht $n$-gram chun faisnéis aonáin chomharsanachta comhchosúla a chomhtháthú san ionadaíocht réise. Chun ár modh a mheas, déanaimid turgnaimh ar thrí thacair sonraí choiteanna neadaithe NER, ACE2004, ACE2005, agus tacair sonraí GENIA. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go n-éiríonn lenár modh feabhsuithe ginearálta ar na trí thagarmharcanna go léir (+$0.30 \\ sim 0.85$ micrea-F1), agus go bhfaigheann sé barraíocht speisialta ar eintitis ísealmhinicíochta (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ cuimhne).', 'ka': 'პრობლემები, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელების კონკონტაქტისთვის გადამუშავებული პრობლემებისთვის უფრო დიდი პრობლემენტი აქვს. მაგრამ, ისინი პრობლემების განმავლობა, როგორც განმავლობა, როდესაც პოტიფიკაციური ინსტაციები და negatifური ინსტაციები უფრო მეტი გადარჩენა. დამატებით, გენერალიზაციის შესაძლებლობა მნიშვნელოვანია NER-ში, როგორც ძალიან დიდი პროპორციო ინტერსტის შესაძლებლობაში არაფერად მოხდება სტრუქციაში. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვცდილობთ გავაკეთოთ განზომილების გამოყენება, განზომილების განზომილების განზომილების გამოყენებით, განზომილების და განზომილების დაკავშირებას n$-დრამის განზომილებების გან განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ განსაკუთრებული ინტერტიკური ინტერტიკური და განსაკუთრებული ინტერტიკური გრაფიკური განსაკუთრებულად დავყენებთ n$-გრამის განსაკუთრებულობაზე, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული ინ ჩვენი მეთოდის შესაბამისთვის, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ სამუშაო NER მონაცემები, ACE2004, ACE2005 და GENIA მონაცემების შესაბამისთვის. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი ყველა სამი წარმოდგენება (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1) და მიიღება სპეციალური უფრო მეტი მარტივი წარმოდგენებაზე (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ დახმარება).', 'it': "I metodi basati su span con la spina dorsale delle reti neurali hanno un grande potenziale per il problema del riconoscimento di entità con nome annidato (NER). Tuttavia, affrontano problemi come la degenerazione quando istanze positive e istanze negative si sovrappongono in gran parte. Inoltre, l'abilità di generalizzazione conta molto nel NER nidificato, poiché una grande percentuale di entità nel set di test difficilmente compare nel set di addestramento. In questo lavoro, cerchiamo di migliorare la rappresentazione di span utilizzando grafici a livello di span basati sul recupero, collegando span ed entità nei dati di formazione basati su funzionalità $n$-gram. Nello specifico, costruiamo il grafico entità-entità e il grafico span-entità globalmente basato sulla somiglianza $n$-gram per integrare le informazioni di entità vicine simili nella rappresentazione span. Per valutare il nostro metodo, conduciamo esperimenti su tre set di dati NER nidificati comuni, ACE2004, ACE2005 e GENIA. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro metodo raggiunge miglioramenti generali su tutti e tre i parametri di riferimento (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ micro-F1), e ottiene una superiorità speciale sulle entità a bassa frequenza (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ richiamo).", 'hu': 'Az ideghálózatok gerinccsontjával végzett span-alapú módszerek nagy potenciállal rendelkeznek a beágyazott nevezett entitás felismerésére (NER). Azonban olyan problémákkal szembesülnek, mint a degeneráció, amikor a pozitív és a negatív esetek nagymértékben átfednek. Emellett az általánosítási képesség sokat számít a beágyazott NER-ben, mivel a tesztkészletben lévő entitások nagy része alig jelenik meg az edzőkészletben. Ebben a munkában megpróbáljuk javítani a span reprezentációt visszakeresési alapú span-szintű grafikonok használatával, összekötési tartományok és entitások összekapcsolásával a képzési adatokban $n$-gram funkciók alapján. Konkrétan az entitás-entitás grafikont és span-entitás grafikont globálisan $n$-gramm hasonlóság alapján építjük fel, hogy integráljuk a hasonló szomszédos entitások információit a span reprezentációba. Módszerünk értékeléséhez három közös beágyazott NER adatkészleten, ACE2004, ACE2005 és GENIA adatkészleten végzünk kísérleteket. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk mindhárom referenciaértéken általános javulást ér el (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ micro-F1), és különleges felsőbbrendűséget ér el az alacsony frekvenciájú entitásoknál (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ visszahívás).', 'kk': 'Невралдық желілердің бағыттауының испан негіздеген әдістері (NER) деп аталған нысанды анықтау мәселесінің үлкен мүмкіндігі бар. Бірақ олар оң жақсы оқиғалар мен негативті оқиғалар көптеген кезде дегенерациялау секілді мәселелелеріне қарайды. Қосымша, жалпы түрлендіру мүмкіндігі NER-де көп маңызды, сынақтағы жиындардың үлкен бөлігі оқыту жиынында көрсетілмейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз $n$-грамм функцияларына негізделген кеңістік графиктерді қолдануға, кеңістік деңгейіндегі кеңістіктерді жұмыс істеуді қолдануға тырыстық. Ескерілікті, біз бөлшектердің графикасын және бөлшектердің графикасын $n$-грамм ұқсас қосымшалардың мәліметін кеңістігіне енгізуге негізделген жалпы графикасын құрамыз. Өзіміздің тәсілімізді бағалау үшін біз үш жалпы NER деректер қорларында, ACE2004, ACE2005 және GENIA деректер қорларында тәжірибелерді жасаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің әдіміміз барлық үш бағдарламалардың жалпы жақсартуларын (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1) жеткізеді, және төмен жиіліктер бағдарламаларының арнайы жақсартылығын (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ еске', 'el': 'Οι μέθοδοι που βασίζονται στο εύρος με τη ραχοκοκαλιά των νευρωνικών δικτύων έχουν μεγάλες δυνατότητες για το πρόβλημα της ένθετης αναγνώρισης ονομαστικών οντοτήτων (ΝΕΡ). Ωστόσο, αντιμετωπίζουν προβλήματα όπως η εκφύλιση όταν τα θετικά και τα αρνητικά περιστατικά αλληλοεπικαλύπτονται σε μεγάλο βαθμό. Εκτός αυτού, η ικανότητα γενικοποίησης έχει μεγάλη σημασία στο ένθετο καθώς ένα μεγάλο ποσοστό οντοτήτων στο δοκιμαστικό σύνολο σπάνια εμφανίζεται στο εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προσπαθούμε να βελτιώσουμε την αναπαράσταση του εύρους χρησιμοποιώντας γραφήματα επιπέδου εύρους, συνδέοντας περιοχές και οντότητες στα δεδομένα κατάρτισης με βάση χαρακτηριστικά $n$-γραμμάτων. Συγκεκριμένα, κατασκευάζουμε το γράφημα οντότητας-οντότητας και το γράφημα κάλυψης-οντότητας παγκοσμίως με βάση την ομοιότητα $για να ενσωματώσουμε τις πληροφορίες παρόμοιων γειτονικών οντοτήτων στην αναπαράσταση του διαστήματος. Για την αξιολόγηση της μεθόδου μας, διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε τρία κοινά ένθετα σύνολα δεδομένων, ACE2004, ACE2005 και GENIA. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει γενικές βελτιώσεις και στα τρία σημεία αναφοράς (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), και αποκτά ιδιαίτερη υπεροχή στις οντότητες χαμηλής συχνότητας (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ ανάκληση).', 'mk': 'Методите базирани на ширење со нервните мрежи имаат голем потенцијал за проблемот со препознавањето на именуваниот ентитет (NER). Сепак, тие се соочуваат со проблеми како што е дегенерирањето кога позитивните инциденти и негативните инциденти во голема мера се прекриваат. Покрај тоа, способноста за генерализација е многу важна во гнездото НЕР, бидејќи голем процент на ентитетите во тестот едвај се појавуваат во сетот на обука. In this work, we try to improve the span representation by utilizing retrieval-based span-level graphs, connecting spans and entities in the training data based on $n$-gram features.  Специфично, ние го градиме графот ентитет-ентитет и графот span-ентитет глобално базиран на сличност од $n$-грам за да ги интегрираме информациите на слични соседи ентитети во представувањето span. За да го процениме нашиот метод, спроведуваме експерименти на три заеднички нистени НЕР податоци, АЦЕ2004, АЦЕ2005 и ГЕНИА податоци. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот метод постигнува генерални подобрувања на сите три стандарди (+ $ 0,30 \\sim 0,85 $ микро-F1), и постигнува специјална супериорност на ентитетите со ниска фреквенција (+ $ 0,56 \\sim 2,08$ повлекување).', 'ms': 'Kaedah berdasarkan Span dengan tulang belakang rangkaian saraf mempunyai potensi besar untuk masalah pengenalan entiti bernama sarang (NER). Namun, mereka menghadapi masalah seperti degenerasi apabila kejadian positif dan kejadian negatif sebahagian besar meliputi. Besides, the generalization ability matters a lot in nested NER, as a large proportion of entities in the test set hardly appear in the training set.  Dalam kerja ini, kami cuba memperbaiki perwakilan jangkauan dengan menggunakan graf tahap jangkauan berdasarkan pemulihan, menyambung jangkauan dan entiti dalam data latihan berdasarkan ciri-ciri $n$-gram. Specifically, we build the entity-entity graph and span-entity graph globally based on $n$-gram similarity to integrate the information of similar neighbor entities into the span representation.  Untuk menilai kaedah kami, kami melakukan eksperimen pada tiga set data NER yang sama, ACE2004, ACE2005, dan GENIA. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita mencapai peningkatan umum pada semua tiga tanda referensi (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), dan mendapatkan ketinggian istimewa pada entiti frekuensi rendah (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ pengingatan).', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്ററുകളുടെ ബാക്കോണുള്ള സ്പാന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ രീതികള്\u200d എന്നാലും സാധാരണ സംഭവ്യങ്ങളും നെഗറേറ്റീവ് സംഭവിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അവര്\u200d പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ മുന്നോട്ട് നോക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റിലെ വലിയ വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പോലെ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ സെറ്റില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പ്രധാനപ്പ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്പാന്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു, റിവിലേഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സ്പാന്\u200d നില ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, സ്പ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d സാധാരണ-സാധാരണ ഗ്രാഫും സ്പാന്\u200d സാധാരണ ഗ്രാഫും ലോകത്ത് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ഇതുപോലുള്ള അയല്\u200dക്കാരുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സ്പാന്\u200d പ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്ന് പൊതുവായ നെയര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. ACE2004, ACE2005 പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മൂന്ന് ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കിലും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നു (+ 0. 30$ 0. 85 മൈക്രോ- F1) പിന്നെ കുറഞ്ഞ ഫ്രൈവ', 'mt': "Span-based methods with the neural networks backbone have great potential for the nested named entity recognition (NER) problem.  Madankollu, jiffaċċjaw problemi bħal deġenerazzjoni meta każijiet pożittivi u każijiet negattivi fil-biċċa l-kbira jikkoinċidu. Barra minn hekk, il-kapaċità ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni hija ta’ importanza kbira f’NER mibnija, peress li proporzjon kbir ta’ entitajiet fis-sett tat-test bilkemm jidhru fis-sett tat-taħriġ. F’dan ix-xogħol, nippruvaw itejbu r-rappreżentanza tal-firxa billi nużaw grafiċi tal-firxa bbażati fuq l-irkupru, nikkollegaw firxiet u entitajiet fid-dejta tat-taħriġ ibbażata fuq karatteristiċi ta’ $n$-gram. Specifically, we build the entity-entity graph and span-entity graph globally based on $n$-gram similarity to integrate the information of similar neighbor entities into the span representation.  To evaluate our method, we conduct experiments on three common nested NER datasets, ACE2004, ACE2005, and GENIA datasets.  Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna jikseb titjib ġenerali fit-tliet punti ta' riferiment kollha (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ mikro-F1), u jikseb superjorità speċjali fuq entitajiet ta' frekwenza baxxa (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ riferiment).", 'no': 'Spanbaserte metodar med bakgrunnsbiletet for neuralnettverket har stor potensial for problemet med gjenkjenning av neste namn på entitet (NER). Dei står imidlertid med problemar som degenererer når positiv instansar og negativ instansar overlappar. I tillegg er generelliseringsverdien mykje viktig i neste NER, som stor andel av einingar i testsettet er vanskeleg vist i opplæringssettet. I denne arbeidet prøver vi å forbetra spennerepresentasjonen ved å bruka grafen på henting basert på spennenivå, kopla mellomrom og einingar i treningsdata basert på funksjonar $n$-gram. Spesifikke bygger vi grafen for entitet-entitet og span-entitet globalt basert på liknande $n$-gram for å integrera informasjonen om liknande naboeentiteter i spanserepresentasjonen. For å evaluera metoden vårt gjer vi eksperimenter på tre felles nesterte NER- datasett, ACE2004, ACE2005 og GENIA- datasett. Eksperimentale resultat viser at metoden vårt gjer generelle forbedringar på alle tre benchmarker (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ micro-F1) og får spesiell overhøgd på låge frekvensentiteter (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ rekoll).', 'mn': 'Спан-суурилсан арга зам нь мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хөндий хөндий хөндий асуудлыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой байдаг. Гэхдээ тэд эерэг тохиолдол болон сөрөг тохиолдолд ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн тохиолдсон асуудлуудтай харагдаж байна. Үүнээс гадна ерөнхийлөгчийн чадвар нь НЭР-д маш чухал, шалгалтын хэмжээ нь сургалтын хэмжээнд харагдахгүй байдаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид хэмжээний үзүүлэлтийг сайжруулахыг хичээдэг бөгөөд хэмжээний хэмжээний графикийг ашиглаж, хөгжүүлэлтийн өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын зай болон сургууль холбогдохыг хичээдэг. Тодорхой хэлбэл, бид Entity-Entity график болон span-Entity график дэлхий дээр төстэй хөрш орнуудын мэдээллийг хэмжээний хэмжээнд оруулахад $n$-грамм төстэй болгон бүтээж байна. Өөрсдийн аргыг үнэлэхэд бид 3 нийтлэг NER өгөгдлийн санг ACE2004, ACE2005, GENIA өгөгдлийн санд туршилт хийдэг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь 3 бага бага хэмжээсүүд дээр ерөнхий сайжруулалт гаргадаг (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ микро-F1) болон бага хэмжээсүүд дээр онцгой өндөр өндөр гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Metody oparte na spanie z kręgosłupem sieci neuronowych mają duży potencjał dla zagnieżdżonego problemu rozpoznawania nazwanych entit (NER). Jednak napotykają one problemy takie jak degeneracja, gdy przypadki pozytywne i negatywne w dużej mierze się nakładają. Poza tym zdolność uogólnienia ma duże znaczenie w zagnieżdżonym NER, ponieważ duża część podmiotów w zestawie testowym ledwo pojawia się w zestawie treningowym. W niniejszej pracy staramy się poprawić reprezentację rozpiętości poprzez wykorzystanie wykresów opartych na pobieraniu opartych na poziomie rozpiętości, łączenie rozpiętości i podmiotów w danych treningowych opartych na cechach $n$-gram. W szczególności budujemy globalnie wykres jednostki-jednostki i wykres rozpiętości-jednostki w oparciu o podobieństwo $n$-gram, aby zintegrować informacje o podobnych sąsiadujących podmiotach z reprezentacją rozpiętości. Aby ocenić naszą metodę, przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na trzech wspólnych zagnieżdżonych zbiorach danych NER, ACE2004, ACE2005 i GENIA. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda osiąga ogólną poprawę we wszystkich trzech punktach odniesienia (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1) i uzyskuje szczególną przewagę nad jednostkami niskiej częstotliwości (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$recall).', 'ro': 'Metodele bazate pe spațiu cu coloana vertebrală a rețelelor neurale au un mare potențial pentru problema recunoașterii entităților numite cuibărite (NER). Cu toate acestea, ele se confruntă cu probleme precum degenerarea atunci când instanțele pozitive și cele negative se suprapun în mare măsură. În plus, capacitatea de generalizare contează foarte mult în NER cuibărit, deoarece o mare parte a entităților din setul de test abia apar în setul de antrenament. În această lucrare, încercăm să îmbunătățim reprezentarea intervalului utilizând grafice bazate pe recuperarea nivelului de interval, conectând intervale și entități în datele de formare bazate pe caracteristicile $n$-gram. Mai exact, construim graficul entitate-entitate și graficul span-entitate la nivel global bazat pe similitudinea $n$-gram pentru a integra informațiile entităților vecine similare în reprezentarea span. Pentru a evalua metoda noastră, efectuăm experimente pe trei seturi comune de date NER cuibărite, ACE2004, ACE2005 și GENIA. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda noastră obține îmbunătățiri generale pe toate cele trei criterii de referință (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85 $ micro-F1), și obține superioritate specială asupra entităților de joasă frecvență (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08 $ rechemare).', 'sr': 'Metade na osnovu španjolske mreže sa neuralnim mrežama imaju veliki potencijal za problem priznanja gnezdenog imena entiteta (NER). Međutim, suočavaju se sa problemima poput degeneracije kada se pozitivni slučajevi i negativni slučajevi uglavnom preklapaju. Osim toga, sposobnost generalizacije je mnogo važna u gnezdenom NER-u, kao veliki deo entiteta u testu koji se teško pojavljuje u setu obuke. U ovom poslu pokušavamo poboljšati predstavljanje razdoblja koristeći grafike na osnovu razdoblja, povezivanje prostora i entiteta u podacima obuke na osnovu karakteristika $ n$. Posebno, izgradili smo grafik entiteta i grafik spanovanja globalno na osnovu sličnosti $ n$ za integraciju informacija sličnih susednih entitata u predstavljanje razdoblja. Da bismo procenili našu metodu, provodili smo eksperimente na tri zajedničke nestale NER podatke, ACE2004, ACE2005 i GENIA podatke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod postiže opće poboljšanje na svim tri kriterija (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ mikro-F1), i dobija specijalnu nadvišenost na niske frekvencije entiteta (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ sećanja).', 'si': 'Name ඒත් ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වගේම සාධාන්තික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අත්\u200d ඒ වගේම, සාමාන්\u200dය ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැදගත් NER වලින්, පරීක්ෂණයේ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වෙන් මේ වැඩේදී, අපි පරිස්සම් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය වැඩ කරන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා, $n$- ග්\u200dරාම් විශේෂතාවට අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා ස්පැන්ස් සහ අධ්\u200dයානය ස විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙන්ම ඉන්තිත්වයක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් සහ ස්පැන්ඩ් ඉන්තිත්වයක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් විශේෂයෙන්ම $n$-ග්\u200dරාම් වගේ සමා අපේ විධානය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය NER දත්ත සෙට් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ACE2004, ACE2005, සහ GENIA දත්ත සෙට්. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ විධානය සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති තුනක් විසිද්ධ වෙන්න (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), ඒ වගේම විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ', 'sv': 'Span-baserade metoder med nervnﾃ､tens ryggrad har stor potential fﾃｶr det kapslade namngivna entitetsigenkﾃ､nningsproblemet (NER). De har dock problem som att degenerera nﾃ､r positiva och negativa fall ﾃｶverlappar varandra. Dessutom spelar generaliseringsfﾃｶrmﾃ･gan stor roll i kapslad NER, eftersom en stor andel enheter i testuppsﾃ､ttningen knappast fﾃｶrekommer i trﾃ､ningsuppsﾃ､ttningen. I detta arbete fﾃｶrsﾃｶker vi fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttra span representation genom att anvﾃ､nda hﾃ､mtningsbaserade span-level grafer, ansluta span och entiteter i utbildningsdata baserat pﾃ･ $n$-grams funktioner. Specifikt bygger vi entitets-entitetsgrafen och span-entitetsgrafen globalt baserat pﾃ･ $n$-gram likhet fﾃｶr att integrera information frﾃ･n liknande grannenheter i span representation. Fﾃｶr att utvﾃ､rdera vﾃ･r metod genomfﾃｶr vi experiment pﾃ･ tre gemensamma kapslade NER-dataset, ACE2004, ACE2005 och GENIA. Experimentella resultat visar att vﾃ･r metod uppnﾃ･r generella fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttringar pﾃ･ alla tre riktmﾃ､rken (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ micro-F1), och erhﾃ･ller sﾃ､rskild ﾃｶverlﾃ､gsenhet pﾃ･ lﾃ･gfrekventa enheter (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ ﾃ･terkallelse).', 'ta': 'Name ஆனால் நேர்ந்த நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும் எதிர்மறை நிகழ்வுகள் பெரும்பாலாக மூடும் போது வேகமான பிரச்சனைகளை பார்க Besides, the generalization ability matters a lot in nested NER, as a large proportion of entities in the test set hardly appear in the training set.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் மீட்டெடுக்கப்பட்ட ஸ்பான் நிலை வரைபடங்களை பயன்படுத்தி, ஸ்பான் மற்றும் பொருள்களை பயன்படுத்தி முயற்சி செய்ய முயற்சி, $n-gram குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் பொருள் உருவாக்கி மற்றும் ஸ்பான் பொருள் வரைப்படத்தை உலகமாக உருவாக்குகிறோம் $n-gram சேர்ந்து போன்ற அண்டை பொருள்களின எங்கள் முறையை மதிப்பீடு செய்ய, நாம் மூன்று பொதுவான NER தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம், ACE2004, ACE2005, GENIA தரவுத்தள முயற்சிக்கும் விளைவுகள் எல்லா மூன்று பென்பொருள்களிலும் எங்கள் முறையில் முன்னேற்றங்களை பெறுகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது (+ 0. 30 $ 0. 85 மைக்ரோ- F1) மற்றும் குறைந்த வெளி', 'so': 'Isticmaalaha lagu saleeyay ee shabakadda neurada ee dhabta ah waxay leeyihiin suurtagal aad u badan in laga helo dhibaatada lagu magacaabay aqoonsashada entity (NER). Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay la kulmaan dhibaatooyin sida degdega ah, marka ay dhacdooyinka suurtagal ah iyo dhacdooyinka waxtar qabta ah ay si badan u daboolaan. Intaas waxaa dheer in awoodda dhalashada ah ay si badan ugu muhiimsan yihiin NER, sida alaabta imtixaanka lagu sameeyo oo aad u badan ayaa looga muuqan karo qoraalka waxbarashada. Markaas waxan waxaynu isku dayaynaa inaad horumarino qaabilaada spanishka, waxaynu ku isticmaalaynaa tallaabooyinka sawirada lagu soo celiyo, oo ku xiriirnaa maalmaha iyo alaabta waxbarashada oo ku saleysan tayada $n-gram. Si gaar ah, waxaynu caalamiga ku dhisaynaa maamulka dhamaanka iyo xarunta sawir-sawirka, taasoo lagu saleynayo tusaale ahaan $n-gram si aan macluumaadka la mid ah ee alaabta deriska oo la mid ahna u dhigno wakiilka spanishka. Si aan u qiimeyno qaababkayaga, waxaynu sameynaa jirrabo ku qoran sadex kooban ee macluumaadyada NER ee caadiga ah, ACE2004, ACE2005 iyo GENIA. Abaalka imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in qaababkayagu uu horumarinayo saddexda qiimaha oo dhan (+ 0.30 $ 0.85 micro-F1), wuxuuna helaa jaamacad gaar ah oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha dhaqdhaqaalaha yar (+ 0.56 \\sim 2.08 dollar).', 'ur': 'نیورل نیٹ ورک کے پشتہڈ کے ساتھ اسپان بنیادی طریقے ہیں جن کا نام نیٹ کی شناسایی (NER) مسئلہ کے لئے بہت بڑا امکانات ہے. لیکن وہ مشکلوں کے سامنے لڑتے ہیں جیسا کہ مثبت حادثہ اور منفی حادثہ بہت زیادہ بالکل بالکل پلٹ جاتے ہیں۔ اس کے علاوہ، عمومی تعلیم قابلیت NER میں بہت اہم ہے، جس طرح آزمائش سٹ میں بہت بڑی مقدار ہے کہ تدریس سٹ میں کم ظاہر ہوتی ہے. اس کام میں، ہم اسپانیٹ کی تصویر کو بہتر کرنے کی کوشش کریں گے، اسپانیٹ-سطح گراف کے استعمال کریں، اسپانیٹ اور ایٹنیٹ ڈالر ڈالر-گرم فوکتوروں پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں. خاص طور پر، ہم نے انٹیٹی-انٹیٹی گراف اور انٹیٹی-انٹیٹی گراف کو دنیا میں ڈالر $-گرم برابری پر بنیاد رکھا ہے کہ اس طرح کے پڑوسی انٹیٹیوں کے معلومات کو اس طرح کے معلومات میں جمع کریں. ہمارے طریقے کے مطابق، ہم تین مشترک نیر ڈیٹسٹ، ACE2004, ACE2005 اور GENIA ڈیٹسٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں. Experimental results show that our method achieves general improvements on all three benchmarks (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), and obtains special superiority on low frequency entities (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ recall).', 'lt': 'Su nervinių tinklų nugaros kaulu pagrįsti metodai turi didelį potencialą susidurti su nested named entity recognition (NER) problema. However, they face problems such as degenerating when positive instances and negative instances largely overlap.  Besides, the generalization ability matters a lot in nested NER, as a large proportion of entities in the test set hardly appear in the training set.  In this work, we try to improve the span representation by utilizing retrieval-based span-level graphs, connecting spans and entities in the training data based on $n$-gram features.  Specifically, we build the entity-entity graph and span-entity graph globally based on $n$-gram similarity to integrate the information of similar neighbor entities into the span representation.  To evaluate our method, we conduct experiments on three common nested NER datasets, ACE2004, ACE2005, and GENIA datasets.  Experimental results show that our method achieves general improvements on all three benchmarks (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), and obtains special superiority on low frequency entities (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ recall).', 'uz': "Name Lekin ular yaxshi shakllar va negativ holatlarni ko'paytirishda harakat qiladi. Ko'rsatilgan, generaliz qobiliyati qo'shilgan NER'da ko'p narsa muhim, chunki sinov sohasidagi bir necha narsa juda katta narsalarning tizimi taʼminlovchi sohasida koʻrinadi. Bu ishda, biz span taqdimotini qayta olish uchun span-darajadagi grafiklardan foydalanishni istaysizmi, span va suhbatlarni $n-gram imkoniyatlari asosida bog'lash mumkin. Ko'rsatilgan, biz jadvalning ma'lumotlarini span-gram asosida bog'liq shaklga grafik va span-tizim grafikni eng yuboramiz. Ko'rib chiqarish uchun biz uchta umumiy NER maʼlumotlar sahifalarini bajaramiz. ACE2004, ACE2005, va GENIA maʼlumotlar sahifasini bajaramiz. Experimental results show that our method achieves general improvements on all three benchmarks (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), and obtains special superiority on low frequency entities (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ recall).", 'vi': 'Phương pháp dựa vào dây thần kinh với xương sống có tiềm năng lớn cho vấn đề nhận dạng thực thể được đặt tên tổ (NER). Tuy nhiên, họ phải đối mặt với những vấn đề như thoái hóa khi các trường hợp tích cực và các trường hợp tiêu cực bị chồng chéo. Ngoài ra, khả năng tổng hợp rất quan trọng trong cái máy ấp, vì một phần lớn các thực thể trong bộ thử gần như không xuất hiện trong bộ huấn luyện. Trong công việc n ày, chúng tôi cố gắng cải thiện bộ trình diễn thời gian bằng cách sử dụng các biểu đồ cấp độ dài dựa vào việc lấy lại, thắt chi tiết và các thực thể trong dữ liệu đào tạo dựa trên các tính năng « n tần số ». Cụ thể, chúng ta xây dựng đồ thị thực thể và bộ phận điều chỉnh trên to àn cầu dựa trên n ét giống nhau « n tần số liên hệ ». Để đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi, chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên ba tập hợp cá nhân ấp chung, ACphux, ACChừng và GEN. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy rằng phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được những cải tiến chung trên tất cả ba điểm tham khảo (+-0.30).', 'bg': 'Методите, базирани на спан с гръбначния стълб на невронните мрежи, имат голям потенциал за проблема с разпознаването на обекти (НЕР). Въпреки това, те са изправени пред проблеми като дегенериране, когато положителните и отрицателните случаи до голяма степен се припокриват. Освен това, способността за обобщаване е от голямо значение в вложени нерви, тъй като голяма част от субектите в тестовия комплект едва ли се появяват в тренировъчния комплект. В тази работа се опитваме да подобрим представянето на диапазона чрез използване на базирани на извличане графики на ниво диапазон, свързващи диапазони и обекти в данните за обучение въз основа на $n$-грам функции. По-конкретно, ние изграждаме графиката entity-entity и диаграмата на обхвата entity глобално въз основа на $n$-грам сходство, за да интегрираме информацията на подобни съседни entiти в представянето на обхвата. За да оценим метода си, провеждаме експерименти върху три общи гнездени набора от данни АСЕ2004, АСЕ2005 и ГЕНИЯ. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни постига общи подобрения на трите показатели (+$0.30 \\сим 0.85$ микро-F1), и получава специално превъзходство при нискочестотни единици (+$0.56 \\сим 2.08$ извличане).', 'nl': 'Span-gebaseerde methoden met de ruggengraat van neurale netwerken hebben een groot potentieel voor het nested named entity recognition (NER) probleem. Ze hebben echter te maken met problemen zoals degeneratie wanneer positieve en negatieve gevallen elkaar grotendeels overlappen. Bovendien is het generalisatievermogen belangrijk in geneste NER, omdat een groot deel van de entiteiten in de testset nauwelijks in de trainingsset voorkomt. In dit werk proberen we de span representatie te verbeteren door gebruik te maken van retrieval-based span-level grafieken, het verbinden van spans en entiteiten in de trainingsgegevens op basis van $n$-gram functies. Specifiek bouwen we de entiteit-entiteit grafiek en span-entiteit grafiek wereldwijd op basis van $n$-gram gelijkenis om de informatie van soortgelijke buurlanden entiteiten te integreren in de span representatie. Om onze methode te evalueren, voeren we experimenten uit op drie gemeenschappelijke geneste NER datasets, ACE2004, ACE2005 en GENIA datasets. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode algemene verbeteringen bereikt op alle drie de benchmarks (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), en speciale superioriteit verkrijgt op laagfrequente entiteiten (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ recall).', 'hr': 'Metade na osnovu španjolskih mreža sa leđa neuronskih mreža imaju veliki potencijal za problem priznanja nestalih imena entiteta (NER). Međutim, suočavaju se s problemima poput degeneracije kada se pozitivni slučajevi i negativni slučajevi uglavnom preklapaju. Osim toga, sposobnost generalizacije je mnogo važna u nestalim NER-u, kao veliki dio subjekta u testu koji se teško pojavljuje u setu obuke. U ovom poslu pokušavamo poboljšati predstavu razdoblja koristeći grafike na razini razdoblja razdoblja, povezivanje prostora i entiteta u podacima obuke na osnovu karakteristika n$ grama. Posebno, izgradimo grafik entiteta i graf ispravnog entiteta globalno na temelju sličnosti n$ grama za integraciju informacija sličnih susjedskih entitata u predstavljanje razdoblja. Da bismo procijenili našu metodu, provodili smo eksperimente na tri zajedničke gnjezdane NER podatke, ACE2004, ACE2005 i GENIA podatke. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod postigne opće poboljšanje na svim tri kriterija (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ mikro-F1) i dobija posebnu nadviđenost na niske frekvencije entiteta (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ sjećanje).', 'da': 'Span-baserede metoder med de neurale netværk rygrad har stort potentiale for indlejret navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER) problem. De står imidlertid over for problemer som degeneration, når positive og negative tilfælde stort set overlapper hinanden. Desuden betyder generaliseringsevnen meget i indlejret NER, da en stor del af enhederne i testsættet næppe optræder i træningssættet. I dette arbejde forsøger vi at forbedre span repræsentationen ved at bruge hentningsbaserede span-niveau grafer, forbinde span og enheder i træningsdataene baseret på $n$-gram funktioner. Specielt bygger vi enhed-enhed graf og span-enhed graf globalt baseret på $n$-gram lighed for at integrere oplysninger om lignende naboenheder i span repræsentationen. For at evaluere vores metode gennemfører vi forsøg på tre fælles indlejrede NER datasæt, ACE2004, ACE2005 og GENIA datasæt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode opnår generelle forbedringer på alle tre benchmarks (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85 $ micro-F1), og opnår særlig overlegenhed på lavfrekvensenheder (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08 $ tilbagekaldelse).', 'de': 'Span-basierte Methoden mit dem neuronalen Netzwerk-Backbone haben großes Potenzial für das Nested Named Entity Recognition (NER)-Problem. Sie stehen jedoch vor Problemen wie Degeneration, wenn positive und negative Instanzen sich weitgehend überschneiden. Außerdem spielt die Generalisierungsfähigkeit bei verschachtelten NER eine große Rolle, da ein großer Teil der Entitäten im Testset kaum im Trainingsset vorkommt. In dieser Arbeit versuchen wir, die Span-Repräsentation zu verbessern, indem wir Retrieval-basierte Span-Level Graphen verwenden, die Spanns und Entitäten in den Trainingsdaten auf Basis von $n$-Gramm Features verbinden. Insbesondere erstellen wir den Entity-Entity-Graph und den Span-Entity-Graph global basierend auf $n$-Gramm Ähnlichkeit, um die Informationen ähnlicher Nachbarentitäten in die Span-Darstellung zu integrieren. Zur Evaluierung unserer Methode führen wir Experimente an drei gemeinsamen verschachtelten NER-Datensätzen durch, ACE2004, ACE2005 und GENIA-Datensätzen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode allgemeine Verbesserungen auf allen drei Benchmarks erzielt (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1) und eine besondere Überlegenheit gegenüber niederfrequenten Entitäten (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ Rückruf).', 'id': 'Metode berbasis Span dengan jaringan saraf tulang belakang memiliki potensi besar untuk masalah pengenalan entitas bernama sarang (NER). Namun, mereka menghadapi masalah seperti degenerasi ketika kejadian positif dan kejadian negatif sebagian besar meliputi. Selain itu, kemampuan generalisasi sangat penting dalam sarang NER, sebagai proporsi besar entitas dalam set tes hampir tidak muncul dalam set latihan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mencoba untuk meningkatkan representasi jangkauan dengan menggunakan grafik tingkat jangkauan berdasarkan penghasilan, menghubungkan jangkauan dan entitas dalam data latihan berdasarkan ciri-ciri $n$-gram. Secara spesifik, kita membangun grafik entitas-entitas dan grafik entitas span globally berdasarkan kesamaan $ n$-gram untuk mengintegrasikan informasi entitas tetangga yang sama ke dalam representation span. Untuk mengevaluasi metode kami, kami melakukan eksperimen pada tiga dataset NER yang sama, ACE2004, ACE2005, dan GENIA dataset. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita mencapai peningkatan umum pada tiga tanda referensi (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), dan mendapatkan superioritas khusus pada entitas frekuensi rendah (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ recall).', 'sw': 'Mindo yenye asili ya Spanish yenye mitandao ya neura ina uwezekano mkubwa wa kutambua vifaa vinavyoitwa (NER) tatizo kubwa. Hata hivyo, wanakabiliwa na matatizo kama vile yanapotokea wakati matukio chanya na matukio yasiyo na hasi yanapoanza sana. Zaidi ya hayo, uwezo wa uzalishaji unahitajika sana katika NEHA, kama kiwango kikubwa cha vitu katika seti la jaribio linaonekana vigumu katika seti ya mafunzo. Katika kazi hii, tunajaribu kuboresha uwakilishi wa spania kwa kutumia picha za kiwango cha usafiri, zinazounganisha spania na vifaa katika taarifa za mafunzo kwa kutumia vipengele vya dola za Kimarekani. Kwa ujumla, tunajenga picha ya entity-entity and grafu ya spania duniani kwa kutumia simu za dola za kimarekani ili kuunganisha taarifa za vitu kama hivyo vya jirani katika uwakilishi wa spania. Ili kutathmini mbinu yetu, tunafanya majaribio katika seti tatu za data zilizotengenezwa na chama cha NER, ACE2004, ACE2005 na seti za data za GENIA. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu hupata maboresho ya ujumla katika bendera zote tatu (+ 0.30 \\simu 0.85 Dola micro-F1), na hupata nafuu maalum juu ya vifaa vya viwango vya chini (+ 0.56 \\simu 2.08).', 'ko': '크로스 기반의 신경 네트워크 메인 방법은 네스트된 실체 식별(NER) 문제에 있어 큰 잠재력을 가진다.그러나 긍정적인 예와 부정적인 예가 어느 정도 중첩되면 퇴화 등 문제에 직면하게 된다.또한 네어에 끼워 넣는 과정에서 범화 능력이 매우 중요하다. 왜냐하면 테스트가 집중된 대부분의 실체가 훈련집중에 거의 나타나지 않기 때문이다.이 작업에서, 우리는 검색 기반의 크로스맵, $n$-gram 특징 연결 트레이닝 데이터의 크로스와 실체를 사용하여 크로스 표현을 개선하려고 합니다.구체적으로 말하면, 우리는 $n$-gram 싱크로율을 바탕으로 전역적으로 실체도와 span 실체도를 구축하여 비슷한 인접한 실체의 정보를 span 표시에 집적한다.우리의 방법을 평가하기 위해, 우리는 세 가지 흔히 볼 수 있는 끼워 넣는 NER 데이터 집합 (ACE 2004, ACE 2005, GENIA 데이터 집합) 에서 실험을 진행하였다.실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 모든 세 가지 기준 테스트(+$0.30\\sim 0.85$micro-F1)에서 보편적인 개선을 얻었고 저주파 실체 테스트(+$0.56\\sim 2.08$recall)에서 특수한 우위를 얻었다.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای بنیاد اسپان با استخوان\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی برای مشکل شناسایی entity (NER) که نامیده شده\u200cاند، پتانسیل بزرگی دارند. با این حال، آنها با مشکلات مثل نابودی در حالی که حادثه مثبت و حادثه منفی بسیار بالا می\u200cافتند روبرو می\u200cشوند. علاوه بر این، توانایی ژنرالیزی بسیار مهم است که در NER آغاز شده، به عنوان مقدار بزرگی از اجتماعات در مجموعه آزمایش سخت در مجموعه آموزش ظاهر نمی شود. در این کار، ما سعی می\u200cکنیم نمایش طولانی را بهتر کنیم با استفاده از گرافهای سطح طولانی بر اساس بازیابی، اتصال فضا و واحدها در داده\u200cهای آموزش بر اساس ویژه\u200cهای n$ گرم. به طور خاصی، ما گراف entity-entity و entity-span-entity را در جهانی بسازیم که بر اساس شباهت n$-gram برای جمع اطلاعات از entities similar in the span representation. برای ارزیابی روش ما، ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی سه تنظیم داده\u200cهای NER مشترک، ACE2004, ACE2005 و GENIA انجام می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که روش ما در تمام سه نمره\u200cهای سنجیره\u200cای عمومی به دست می\u200cآید (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1) و به خاطر یادآوری\u200cهای فرکانس\u200cهای کم ویژه\u200cای ویژه می\u200cگیرد (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$).', 'tr': "Neral şebekeleri bilen Span taýýarlanan yöntemler, unit tanımlama (NER) meselesi üçin beýik bir potensial bar. Ýöne pozitif ýagdaýlar we negatif ýagdaýlar öňünden geçişinde azalmak ýaly problemlerle ýüz tutarlar. Munuň ýagdaýda, umumy taýýarlama ukyplary NER'de köp wajyp görýär, synagda takyklaryň uly bölegi görýär. Bu işde, geri alma derejesinde baýlyk grafiklerini ulanarak, okuwçysy we guramlaryny $n$-gram özelliklerine dayanan okuwçysy barlamaga synanyşýarys. Adatça, unit-entitet grafiki we span-entitet grafiki dün ýä $n$-gram benzeri bir goňşu guramlaryň maglumatyny span çarpmasına daýarys. Biziň ýüregimizi deňlemek üçin 3 dürli NER veri setirlerinde, ACE2004, ACE2005 we GENIA veri setirlerinde deneyler çykýarys. Experimental netijelerimiz biziň metodamyzyň ähli üç etim merkezinde umumy gelişmeleri ýetişdirýändigini görkezýär (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ mikro-F1), we düşük frekans guramlarynda özel üstünlik gazanýar (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ ýatlamak üçin).", 'sq': 'Span-based methods with the neural networks backbone have great potential for the nested named entity recognition (NER) problem.  Megjithatë, ata ndeshen me probleme të tilla si degenerimi kur rastet pozitive dhe rastet negative mbishtypen kryesisht. Përveç kësaj, aftësia e gjeneralizimit ka rëndësi shumë në NER të folur, pasi një pjesë e madhe e njësive në grupin e testeve vështirë duken në grupin e trajnimit. Në këtë punë, ne përpiqemi të përmirësojmë përfaqësimin e fushës duke përdorur grafikë të nivelit të fushës bazuar n ë marrje, lidhje të fushës dhe njësive në të dhënat e trainimit bazuar në karakteristikat $n$-gram. Veçanërisht, ne ndërtojmë grafikun e njësisë-njësisë dhe grafikun e njësisë-span globalisht bazuar n ë ngjashmërinë $n$-gram për të integruar informacionin e njësisë fqinje të ngjashme në përfaqësimin e intervalit. Për të vlerësuar metodën tonë, ne kryejmë eksperimente në tre grupe të dhënash të përbashkëta NER, ACE2004, ACE2005 dhe GENIA. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda jonë arrin përmirësime të përgjithshme në të tre standartet (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1) dhe fiton superioritet të posaçëm në njësitë me frekuencë të ulët (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ tërheqje).', 'am': 'የኔውራዊ መረብ ጀርባ ማጠቃለያ የተደረገ ስርዓቶች አካባቢ ማስታወቂያው (NER) መከራ የደረሰባቸው ስልጣናት በጣም የበለጠ ችሎታ አላቸው። ምንም እንኳን፣ የፖለቲካ ሁኔታዎች እና የnegative ሁኔታዎች በተለየ ጊዜ የሚቆጠሩ ጉዳዮች ይጋጠማሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የጠቅላላ ኃይል በNER ውስጥ ብዙ ነገር ያስፈልጋል፣ በፈተናው ማሰናከል ውስጥ ብዙ አካላት በጭንቅ ይታያል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የስፓን መልዕክት ማሻሻል እናደርጋለን፡፡ Specifically, we build the entity-entity graph and span-entity graph globally based on $n$-gram similarity to integrate the information of similar neighbor entities into the span representation.  መንገዳችንን ለማስተዋል፣ ሦስት የተለየ የNER ዳታተሮች፣ ACE2004፣ ACE2005 እና GENIA ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የሦስት benchmarks (0.30$ 0.85 ሚክሮአር-F1) የባሕላዊ ማድረግ ማድረግ እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Span-gebaseerde metodes met die neuralnetwerk agterbou het groot potensieal vir die naaste entiteit herken (NER) probleem. Maar hulle aangesig probleme soos degenereer wanneer positiewe voorbeelde en negatiewe voorbeelde groot oorvloei. In buite van, die generelliseringsverdigheid het 'n baie saak in neste NER, as 'n groot proporsie van entiteite in die toets stel skaars verskyn in die onderwerp stel. In hierdie werk probeer ons die span-voorstelling te verbeter deur die gebruik van herhaal-gebaseerde span-vlak-grafie, die koppeling van spans en entiteite in die oefening-data gebaseer op $n$-gram-funksies. Spesifieke, ons bou die entiteit-entiteit-graaf en span-entiteit-graaf globaal gebaseer op $n$-gram gelykenis om die inligting van gelykende naaste entiteite in die span-voorstelling te integreer. Om ons metode te evalueer, doen ons eksperimente op drie gemeenskaplike nuwe datastelle, ACE2004, ACE2005 en GENIA datastelle. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons metode algemene verbeteringe op alle drie benchmarke (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ mikro-F1) bereik en spesiale superiority op lae frekwensieentiteite (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ reken).", 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերով հիմնված մեթոդները մեծ պոտենցիալ ունեն, որպեսզի հանդիսանան անվանելի էության ճանաչման խնդիրը: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք հանդիպում են այնպիսի խնդիրների, ինչպիսիք են դեգեներացիան, երբ դրական և բացասական դեպքերը մեծ մասամբ հակառակվում են: Ավելին, ընդհանուր ընդհանուր կարողությունը շատ կարևոր է ՆԵՌ-ում, քանի որ փորձարկումների մեծ մասը հազիվ է ներկայացնում փորձարկումների համակարգում: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք փորձում ենք բարելավել բազմազանությունը օգտագործելով վերադարձման հիմնված բազմազանության գծագրեր, կապելով բազմազանություններ և միավորներ կրթության տվյալներում, հիմնված $n$-գրամի հատկությունների վրա: Հատկապես, մենք կառուցում ենք էության-էության գրաֆիկը և էության-էության գրաֆիկը գլոբալ հիմնված $n$-գրամի նմանության վրա, որպեսզի ինտեգրենք նման հարևան էության տեղեկատվությունը տարածության ներկայացման մեջ: Մեր մեթոդը գնահատելու համար մենք կատարում ենք փորձարկումներ երեք ընդհանուր խմբագրված ՆԵՌ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, ACE2004, ACE2005 և Ջենիայի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը հասնում է ընդհանուր բարելավումներին բոլոր երեք հարաբերականների վրա (+$0.30 \\SIM 0.85$ միկրո-F1), և ստանում է հատուկ գերազանցություն ցածր հաճախականության միավորների վրա (+$0.56 \\SIM 2.8$ հիշեցում).', 'bn': 'স্প্যান ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যাকবোনের মাধ্যমে স্প্যান ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতিগুলোর নাম নির্বাচিত বস্ত তবে তাদের সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হচ্ছে যেমন ইতিবাচক ঘটনা এবং নেতিবাচক ঘটনাগুলো বেশীরভাগ ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হয়। এছাড়াও, প্রশিক্ষণ সেটে প্রশিক্ষণ সংক্রান্ত বস্তুর বিশাল অংশ হিসেবে জেনারেলেশনের ক্ষমতা অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। এই কাজে আমরা স্প্যানের প্রতিনিধিত্ব উন্নত করার চেষ্টা করছি স্প্যান-ভিত্তিক স্প্যান-স্তরের গ্রাফ ব্যবহার করে, স্প্যান এবং বস্তুদের প্রশিক্ষণের বিশেষ করে, আমরা সারা বিশ্বের স্প্যান-বস্তুর গ্রাফ এবং স্প্যান-সাধারণ গ্রাফ বিশ্বের ভিত্তিতে নির্মাণ করি একই ধরনের প্রতিবেশী বস্তুর তথ্য স্ আমাদের পদ্ধতি মূল্যায়নের জন্য আমরা তিনটি সাধারণ নেস্ট ডাটাসেট, ACE2004, ACE2005 এবং জেনিয়া ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সকল তিনটি বেনমার্কের উপর সাধারণ উন্নতি পাবে (+ 0. 30 ডলার ০. 85 মাইক্রো-F1) এবং কম ফ্রাইজেন্সি বিষয়বস্তুর উপর বিশেষ উন্নতি পাবে (+ 0. 56\\sim', 'az': 'Nöral ağ sümükləri ilə Span-tabanlı metodları, nörd adlı nörd tanıması (NER) problemi üçün böyük potensial var. Lakin, pozitif olaraq və negatif olaraq çox yüksək dəyişiklik olduğu kimi dəyişiklik problemlərlə qarşılaşırlar. Üstəlik, generalizasyon qabiliyyəti NER-də çox mövcuddur, sınama qurulduğu təhsil qurulduğu təhsil qurulduğu üçün çox böyük bir hissəsi olaraq. Bu işdə, təhsil məlumatın ın n$-gram fəaliyyətlərinə dayanan təhsil məlumatının istifadəsi ilə uzaqlaşdırmağa çalışırıq. Beləliklə, biz bir entiti-entiti grafın ı və span-entity grafını dünya həyatında $n$-gram kimiliğinə dayandırırıq ki, bənzər qonşu entitlərin məlumatlarının məlumatlarını müəyyən edilməsinə daxil edirik. Bizim metodumuzu değerləşdirmək üçün, üç ortaq NER veri qurğuları, ACE2004, ACE2005 və GENIA veri qurğuları təşkil edirik. Experimental sonuçlarımız, metodumuzun üç benchmarkı üzərində genel təmizlənəcəyini göstərir (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ mikro-F1) və düşük frekans entitələri üzərində özel üstünlük alır (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ yadına salır).', 'et': 'Span-põhistel meetoditel koos neuraalvõrkude selgrooga on suur potentsiaal pesastatud nimega olemi tuvastamise (NER) probleemiks. Siiski seisavad nad silmitsi probleemidega, näiteks degeneratsiooniga, kui positiivsed ja negatiivsed juhtumid kattuvad suures osas. Lisaks on pesastatud NER-is oluline generaliseerimisvõime, sest suur osa testikomplektis olevatest üksustest vaevalt ei ilmu treeningkomplektis. Selles töös püüame parandada span representatsiooni, kasutades tagasivõtmispõhiseid span-taseme graafikuid, ühendades span ja olemid koolitusandmetes $n$-grammi funktsioonide põhjal. Täpsemalt ehitame olemi-olemi graafiku ja span-olemi graafiku globaalselt $n$-grammi sarnasuse põhjal, et integreerida sarnaste naaberolemite teave span-representatsiooni. Meie meetodi hindamiseks teostame katseid kolme ühise pesastatud NER andmekogumiga, ACE2004, ACE2005 ja GENIA andmekogumiga. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod saavutab üldise paranemise kõigis kolmes võrdlusnäitajas (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ mikro-F1) ja saavutab erilise paremuse madala sagedusega olemustes (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ tagasikutsumine).', 'ca': "Span-based methods with the neural networks backbone have great potential for the nested named entity recognition (NER) problem.  Tot i així, es troben amb problemes com la degeneració quan les instances positives i negatives sobreponen en gran part. A més, l'habilitat de generalització té molta importància en NER ninjat, perquè una gran proporció d'entitats en el conjunt d'exàmens gairebé no apareixen en el conjunt d'entrenaments. En aquesta feina intentem millorar la representació de l'espai utilitzant gràfics de nivell d'espai basats en la recuperació, connectant l'espai i les entitats en les dades d'entrenament basades en característiques de $n$-gram. Concretament, construïm el gràfic de l'entitat-entitat i el gràfic de l'entitat-ampliació basat globalment en la similitud de $n$-gram per integrar la informació d'entitats veïnes similars en la representació de l'ampliació. Per avaluar el nostre mètode, fem experiments en tres conjunts comuns de dades NER, ACE2004, ACE2005 i GENIA. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre mètode aconsegueix millores generals en els tres punts de referència (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85 $ micro-F1), i obté superioritat especial en entitats de baixa freqüència (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ recuperació).", 'cs': 'Metody založené na rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER) s páteří neuronových sítí mají velký potenciál. Čelí však problémům, jako je degenerace, když se kladné a negativní případy do značné míry překrývají. Kromě toho, generalizační schopnost záleží na vnořeném NER, protože velký podíl entit v testovací sadě se sotva objevuje v tréninkové sadě. V této práci se snažíme zlepšit reprezentaci rozpětí využitím grafů založených na vyhledávání rozpětí úrovně, propojením rozpětí a entit v tréninkových datech založených na $n$-gram funkcích. Konkrétně sestavujeme graf entity-entity a graf rozpětí-entity globálně založený na podobnosti $n$-gram, abychom integrovali informace podobných sousedních entit do reprezentace rozpětí. Pro vyhodnocení naší metody provádíme experimenty na třech běžných vnořených datových sadách NER, ACE2004, ACE2005 a GENIA. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda dosahuje obecných zlepšení ve všech třech benchmarkech (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1) a získává zvláštní nadřazenost nad nízkofrekvenčními entitami (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$).', 'fi': 'Span-pohjaisilla menetelmillä on suuri potentiaali sisäkkäisiin nimettyihin entiteettitunnistusongelmiin (NER). Ne kohtaavat kuitenkin ongelmia, kuten rappeutumista, kun positiiviset ja negatiiviset tapaukset ovat pitkälti päällekkäisiä. Lisäksi yleistyskyvyllä on paljon merkitystä sisäkkäisessä NER:ssä, sillä suuri osa testisarjan kokonaisuuksista tuskin esiintyy harjoitussarjassa. Tässä työssä pyrimme parantamaan spanin esitystä hyödyntämällä hakupohjaisia span-tason kaavioita, yhdistämällä spanit ja entiteetit harjoitusdataan $n$-gram-ominaisuuksien perusteella. Erityisesti rakennamme entiteetti-entiteetti-kaavion ja span-entity-kaavion maailmanlaajuisesti $n$-gramman samankaltaisuuden perusteella integroidaksemme samankaltaisten naapurientiteettien tiedot span-esitykseen. Menetelmämme arvioimiseksi teemme kokeita kolmella yhteisellä sisäkkäisellä NER-aineistolla, ACE2004-, ACE2005- ja GENIA-aineistolla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme saavuttaa yleisiä parannuksia kaikissa kolmessa vertailuarvossa (+ 0,30 \\sim 0,85 $ mikro-F1), ja saavuttaa erityisen ylivoiman matalataajuuksisissa entiteeteissä (+ 0,56 \\sim 2,08 $ takaisinkutsu).', 'bs': 'Metade osnovane na spanu sa nervnim mrežama imaju veliki potencijal za problem sa priznanjem područja po imenu entiteta (NER). Međutim, oni se suočavaju sa problemima poput degeneracije kada se pozitivni slučajevi i negativni slučajevi uglavnom preklapaju. Osim toga, sposobnost generalizacije je mnogo važna u nestalim NER-u, kao veliki deo entiteta u testu koji se teško pojavljuje u setu obuke. U ovom poslu pokušavamo poboljšati predstavljanje razdoblja koristeći grafike na razini razdoblja, povezivanje prostora i entiteta u podacima obuke na osnovu karakteristika n$ grama. Posebno, mi gradimo grafik entiteta i grafik spanovanja globalno na osnovu sličnosti n$ grama za integraciju informacija sličnih susjednih entitata u predstavljanje razdoblja. Da bismo procenili našu metodu, provodili smo eksperimente na tri zajedničke nestale NER dataset, ACE2004, ACE2005 i GENIA dataset. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš metod postigne opće poboljšanje na svim tri kriterija (+$0,30 \\sim 0,85$ mikro-F1), i dobija specijalnu nadviđenost na niske frekvencije entiteta (+$0,56 \\sim 2,08$ sjećanja).', 'ha': "Shiryoyin da aka ƙayyade salon da ke samun jerin neural sun yi mataimaki mai girma wa masu sunan shaidar abun (NER). A lokacin da haka, sai su haɗi masu matsayi kamar da za'a yi damƙara idan masu motsi da masu motsi masu yiwuni sun ƙara bayani. Babu haka, awon mai General na muhimu masu cikin NER na ƙaranci, kamar rabon duk abubuwa na cikin matsayin jarrabãwa na ƙara baya a cikin tsarin da aka yi amfani da shi. Daga wannan aikin, Munã jarraba, ko za Mu ƙara bayani ga wakin spani da za'a yi amfani da grafyuta-mai motsi, yana haɗa spani da maɓalli cikin data na ƙidãya a kan fancy na $n-gram. A ƙayyade, Munã samar da grafi na-halin abun-abun da graphi na span-abun a kan ƙasa, a kan daidaita $n-gram, dõmin ka haɗa information on abubuwa masu kama da shi zuwa mai wakilishi cikin span. To, dõmin ka ƙaddara hanyoyinmu, za mu yi jarrabi akan data ta samu'a uku masu haɗi na NER, AE2004, AKE2005 da GENIA. Matarin jarrabawa na nuna cewa metodenmu yana sãmu mafarinta ga duk bangon uku (+ 0.30 $ 0.85 masu micro-F1), kuma yana sami mafiya girma a kan masu nau'in manyan mutane (+.0.46 $ sami 2.08$ za'a sami).", 'sk': 'Metode, ki temeljijo na spanu z hrbtenico nevronskih omrežij, imajo velik potencial za težavo gnezdenega imenovanega prepoznavanja entitet (NER). Vendar se soočajo s težavami, kot je degeneracija, ko se pozitivni in negativni primeri v veliki meri prekrivajo. Poleg tega je sposobnost generalizacije v gnezdenem NER veliko pomembna, saj se velik delež entitet v testnem naboru komaj pojavi v naboru treningov. V tem delu poskušamo izboljšati predstavitev razpona z uporabo grafikonov razpona, ki temeljijo na iskanju, povezovanjem razponov in entitet v podatkih usposabljanja, ki temeljijo na funkcijah $n$-gram. Natančneje, gradimo graf entitete-entitete in graf razpona entitete globalno na podlagi podobnosti $n$-gram, da vključimo informacije podobnih sosednjih entitet v predstavitev razpona. Za vrednotenje naše metode izvajamo poskuse na treh skupnih gnezdenih NER naborih podatkov, ACE2004, ACE2005 in GENIA. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda doseže splošne izboljšave na vseh treh referenčnih vrednostih (+ 0,30 \\sim 0,85$ mikro-F1) in pridobi posebno superiornost pri nizkofrekvenčnih entitetah (+ 0,56 \\sim 2,08$ odpoklic).', 'jv': 'FindOK Yo, yo sampeyan ambekan perkoro sing dikarol luwih dumadhi, ngono cah-ingkang liyane Nyong-ayo kabèh, pisan kelas Generalizasi yengan akeh sabèh nêr, sedhaya kang diolah sampeyan katimbang nggo ujian sisan katimbang nggo ndelok Nang iki trabah, kita ngubah nggawe perintah dumadhingan langkung nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang-nggawe barang nggawe barang-nggawe barang nggawe barang-nggawe lan barang-nggawe barang-nggawe barang-nggawe barang-nggawe barang-ngga CURRENTCURRENT Ngawe Perintah sing ditambahak, kita nguasai perbudhakan kanggo telu Common NeR dataset, AA2004, AA5, lan GENIA dataset. User Refirming', 'bo': 'Span-based methods with the neural network backbone have great potential for the nested entity recognition (NER) problem. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་རྐྱེན་སྡོད་དང་། ལས་འགུལ་བའི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཆེ་བས་ཕར་བསྐྱེད་དུས་སྐབས་བཅས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ང དེ་ལས། སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཉེན་བརྗོད་པ་ནང་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད། In this work, we try to improve the span representation by utilizing retrieval-based span-level graphs, connecting spans and entities in the training data based on $n$-gram features. Specifically, we build the entity-entity graph and span-entity graph globally based on $n$-gram similarity to integrate the information of similar neighbor entities into the span representation. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་པར་ལེན་བྱེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་པའི་NER གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གསུམ་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཚོལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experimental results show that our method achieves general improvements on all three benchmarks (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), and obtains special superiority on low frequency entities (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ recall).', 'he': "שיטות מבוססות על ספנס עם רשתות העצביות יש פוטנציאל גדול לבעיה של זיהוי היחידות בשם הקן (NER). בכל אופן, הם מתמודדים עם בעיות כגון התגרות כאשר מקרים חיוביים ומקרים שליליים מתקפלים בעיקר. חוץ מזה, יכולת הגנרליזציה חשובה מאוד בקן NER, כיוון אחוז גדול של יחידות במבחן בקושי מופיע בסט האימונים. In this work, we try to improve the span representation by utilizing retrieval-based span-level graphs, connecting spans and entities in the training data based on $n$-gram features.  Specifically, we build the entity-entity graph and span-entity graph globally based on $n$-gram similarity to integrate the information of similar neighbor entities into the span representation.  כדי להעריך את השיטה שלנו, אנו מבצעים ניסויים על שלושה קבוצות מידע NER קבועות משותפות, ACE2004, ACE2005, וג'ניה. Experimental results show that our method achieves general improvements on all three benchmarks (+$0.30 \\sim 0.85$ micro-F1), and obtains special superiority on low frequency entities (+$0.56 \\sim 2.08$ recall)."}
{'en': 'Word Segmentation as Unsupervised Constituency Parsing', 'ar': 'CogTaskonomy: يعتبر تصنيف المهام المستوحى من المعرفة مفيدًا لنقل التعلم في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية', 'pt': 'CogTaskonomy: Taxonomia de Tarefas Inspirada Cognitivamente é Benéfica para Transferir Aprendizagem em PNL', 'fr': "CogTaskonomy\xa0: La taxonomie des tâches inspirée par la cognition est bénéfique pour l'apprentissage par transfert en PNL", 'es': 'CogtasKonomy: La taxonomía de tareas inspirada cognitivamente es beneficiosa para transferir el aprendizaje en la PNL', 'ja': 'CogTaskonomy ：認知的にインスパイアされたタスク分類は、NLPでの転送学習に有益である', 'hi': 'CogTaskonomy: संज्ञानात्मक रूप से प्रेरित कार्य वर्गीकरण एनएलपी में सीखने को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए फायदेमंद है', 'zh': 'CogTaskonomy:知事分类法利NLP迁学', 'ru': 'CogTaskonomy: Когнитивно вдохновленная таксономия задач полезна для передачи обучения в NLP', 'ga': 'CogTaskonomy: Tá Tacsanomaíocht Tasc arna Spreagadh Cognaíoch Tairbheach chun Foghlaim a Aistriú in NLP', 'ka': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy is beneficial to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'el': 'Γνωσιακή Τακωνονομία: Η γνωστικά εμπνευσμένη Ταξινομία Εργασίας είναι ευεργετική για τη μεταφορά της Μάθησης στο ΝΛΠ', 'hu': 'Kognitómia: A kognitív inspirált feladat taxonómia előnyös a tanulás átadásában az NLP-ben', 'kk': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy is useful to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'mk': 'CogTaskonomy: Когнитивно инспирираната таксономија на задачите е корисна за префрлање на учењето во NLP', 'it': "La tassonomia dei compiti di ispirazione cognitiva è utile per trasferire l'apprendimento nella PNL", 'lt': 'CogTaskonomy: cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy Is Beneficial to Transfer Learning NLP', 'ml': 'കോഗ്ടാസ്കോണി: ജോലി ടാക്സോനോമി നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായി പ്രവേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടാസ്കോണിയാണ് NLP-ല്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിന്', 'ms': 'CogTaskonomy: Taxonomy Tugas DiInspirasikan Dengan Mengetahui Beruntung untuk Memindahkan Belajar dalam NLP', 'mn': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy Is Beneficent to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'mt': 'CogTaskonomy: Task Taxonomy Inspired Cognitively Is Beneficial to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'no': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy er nyttig for å overføra læring i NLP', 'pl': 'CognitivTaskonomy: Taksonomia zadań inspirowanych poznawczo jest korzystna dla transferu nauki w NLP', 'sr': 'CogTaskonomy: Kognitivno inspirisana taksonomija zadataka je korisna za učenje prijenosa u NLP-u', 'ro': 'Cognitiv Taskonomie: Taxonomia sarcinilor inspirate cognitiv este benefică pentru transferul învățării în PNL', 'si': 'CogJob අධ්\u200dයානය: Coknowively Inspyred Job Taxynoy is Benetful to Transfer Training in NLP', 'so': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Tax xonomy is Benefactory to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'ta': 'CogTaskonomy: குறிப்பிட்ட பணி பணி குறிப்பிடுதல் NLP மாற்றும் கற்றத்திற்கு உதவியானது', 'sv': 'Kognitiv Taskonomi: Kognitivt inspirerad Task Taxonomi är fördelaktigt för att överföra lärande i NLP', 'ur': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy is beneficial to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'uz': 'KogTaskonomi: Vazifani koʻpaytirilgan vazifa', 'vi': 'CogTaskonomy: Công việc nấu ăn tự động, có lợi cho công việc', 'nl': 'Cognitieve Taskonomie: Cognitief geïnspireerde Taaktaxonomie is gunstig voor de overdracht van leren in NLP', 'hr': 'CogTaskonomy: Kognitivno inspirirana taksonomija zadataka je koristna za učenje prijenosa u NLP-u', 'bg': 'Когнитивно вдъхновената таксономия на задачите е полезна за трансфер на обучение в НЛП', 'ko': '협동 임무 분류법: 인지 계발의 임무 분류법은 NLP에서의 이동 학습에 도움이 된다', 'id': 'CogTaskonomy: Task Taxonomy DiInspirasikan secara Cognitive Is Beneficial to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'sw': 'CogTaskonomy: Utamaduni wa Tamko kwa ujumla ni Utawala wa Kuhamasisha Uhamiaji NLP', 'fa': 'CogTaskonomy: Taxonomy Task Cognitively Inspired Is beneficial to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'de': 'CognitivTaskonomy: Kognitiv inspirierte Tasktaxonomie ist vorteilhaft für den Transfer von Lernen in NLP', 'da': 'KognitTaskonomi: Kognitivt inspireret opgavesaxonomi er gavnlig for at overføre læring i NLP', 'tr': 'CogTaskonomy:Cognitively Inspired Task Taxony Is Useful to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'am': 'CogTaskonomy: በማውቀት የስራ ስራ ስኮኖሚ በNLP ለመተላለፍ ትምህርት የሚጠቅመው ነው', 'af': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy is Benefinieerd na Oordrag Leer in NLP', 'az': 'CogTaskonomy', 'hy': 'CogTaskonomy: Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy Is Beneficial to Transfer Learning in NLP', 'sq': 'CogTaskonomy: Taksonomia e detyrave të inspiruara njohurisht është e dobishme për të transferuar mësimin në NLP', 'bs': 'CogTaskonomy: Kognitivno inspirirana taksonomija zadataka je korisna za učenje prijenosa u NLP-u', 'ca': "CogTaskonomy: La taxonomia cognitivament inspirada és beneficiosa per l'aprenentatge de transferència en NLP", 'cs': 'Cognitivní Taskonomie: Kognitivně inspirovaná taxonomie úkolů je přínosná pro přenos učení v NLP', 'bn': 'কোগটাস্কোনোমি: কাজের কাজ অনুপ্রাণিত করা হয়েছে কাজের ট্যাক্সোনোমি এনএলপিতে ট্রান্সফারার শিক্ষা প্রদানের জন্', 'et': 'Kognitiivselt inspireeritud ülesannete taksonoomia on kasulik õppimise ülekandmisel uues õppekavas', 'fi': 'Kognitiivisesti inspiroitunut tehtävätaksonomia on hyödyllistä siirtää oppimista NLP:ssä', 'jv': 'Cogtask', 'sk': 'Kognitivno navdihnjena taksonomija nalog je koristna za prenos učenja v NLP', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'CogTaskonomy: טקסונומיה במשימה משותפת באופן מודע היא תועלת ללמוד העברה ב NLP', 'bo': 'CogTaskonomy:Cognitively Inspired Task Taxonomy Is Beneficial to Transfer Learning in NLP'}
{'en': 'Word identification from continuous input is typically viewed as a segmentation task Experiments with human adults suggest that familiarity with syntactic structures in their native language also influences word identification in artificial languages however the relation between syntactic processing and word identification is yet unclear This work takes one step forward by exploring a radically different approach of word identification in which segmentation of a continuous input is viewed as a process isomorphic to unsupervised constituency parsing Besides formalizing the approach this study reports simulations of human experiments with DIORA Drozdov et al a neural unsupervised constituency parser Results show that this model can reproduce human behavior in word identification experiments suggesting that this is a viable approach to study word identification and its relation to syntactic processing', 'ar': 'هل هناك مبدأ لتوجيه التعلم عبر المهام في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP)؟ يجد التصنيف (Zamir et al. ، 2018) أن هناك بنية بين المهام المرئية ، كمبدأ يقوم عليه نقل التعلم بالنسبة لهم. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطار عمل مستوحى من المعرفة ، CogTaskonomy ، لتعلم تصنيف مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. يتكون إطار العمل من تحليلات التمثيل المعرفي (CRA) ورسم الخرائط المعرفية العصبية (CNM). يستخدم الأول تحليل التشابه التمثيلي ، والذي يستخدم بشكل شائع في علم الأعصاب الحسابي لإيجاد علاقة بين قياس نشاط الدماغ والنمذجة الحسابية ، لتقدير تشابه المهام مع تمثيلات الجمل الخاصة بالمهمة. يتعلم هذا الأخير اكتشاف علاقات المهام من خلال عرض التمثيلات العصبية من نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية إلى الإشارات المعرفية (أي fMRI voxels). توضح التجارب على 12 مهمة من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، حيث يتم استخدام BERT / TinyBERT كنماذج أساسية لنقل التعلم ، أن CogTaxonomy المقترح قادر على توجيه تعلم النقل ، وتحقيق أداء تنافسي مع عملية التسلسل الهرمي التحليلي (Saaty ، 1987) المستخدمة في المهام المرئية ( Zamir et al.، 2018) ولكن دون الحاجة إلى نقل مهمة $ O (m ^ 2) $. تكتشف التحليلات أيضًا أن CNM قادر على تعلم تصنيف المهام الحيادية.', 'fr': "Existe-t-il un principe pour guider l'apprentissage par transfert entre les tâches du traitement du langage naturel (PNL)\xa0? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) constate qu'il existe une structure parmi les tâches visuelles, en tant que principe sous-jacent à l'apprentissage par transfert pour celles-ci. Dans cet article, nous proposons un cadre inspiré de la cognition, CogtasKonomy, pour apprendre la taxonomie des tâches de PNL. Le cadre comprend l'analyse cognitive de la représentation (CRA) et la cartographie cognitive-neuronale (CNM). Le premier utilise l'analyse de similarité représentationnelle, qui est couramment utilisée en neuroscience computationnelle pour trouver une corrélation entre la mesure de l'activité cérébrale et la modélisation informatique, afin d'estimer la similarité des tâches avec des représentations de phrases spécifiques à des tâches. Ce dernier apprend à détecter les relations entre les tâches en projetant des représentations neuronales à partir de modèles de PNL sur des signaux cognitifs (c.-à-d. des voxels IRMf). Des expériences sur 12 tâches de PNL, dans lesquelles Bert/Tinybert sont utilisés comme modèles sous-jacents pour l'apprentissage par transfert, démontrent que la CogTaxonomie proposée est capable de guider l'apprentissage par transfert, obtenant des performances compétitives par rapport au processus de hiérarchie analytique (Saaty, 1987) utilisé dans la Taskonomie visuelle (Zamir et al., 2018) mais sans nécessiter de transfert de tâches $O (m^2) $ par paire exhaustif. Les analyses révèlent également que le CNM est capable d'apprendre la taxonomie des tâches indépendante du modèle.", 'pt': 'Existe um princípio para orientar o aprendizado de transferência entre tarefas no processamento de linguagem natural (PNL)? A taxonomia (Zamir et al., 2018) constata que existe uma estrutura entre as tarefas visuais, como princípio subjacente à aprendizagem de transferência para elas. Neste artigo, propomos uma estrutura de inspiração cognitiva, CogTaskonomy, para aprender taxonomia para tarefas de PNL. A estrutura consiste em Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) e Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). O primeiro emprega a Análise de Similaridade Representacional, que é comumente usada em neurociência computacional para encontrar uma correlação entre a medição da atividade cerebral e a modelagem computacional, para estimar a similaridade de tarefas com representações de sentenças específicas de tarefas. O último aprende a detectar relações de tarefa projetando representações neurais de modelos de PNL para sinais cognitivos (ou seja, voxels de fMRI). Experimentos em 12 tarefas de PNL, onde BERT/TinyBERT são usados como modelos subjacentes para aprendizagem de transferência, demonstram que a CogTaxonomy proposta é capaz de guiar a aprendizagem de transferência, alcançando desempenho competitivo para o Analytic Hierarchy Process (Saaty, 1987) usado em Taskonomy visual ( Zamir et al., 2018), mas sem exigir transferência exaustiva de tarefas $O(m^2)$ aos pares. As análises descobrem ainda que o CNM é capaz de aprender taxonomia de tarefas agnósticas de modelo.', 'es': '¿Existe un principio que guíe el aprendizaje de transferencia entre las tareas del procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP)? La taxonomía (Zamir et al., 2018) encuentra que existe una estructura entre las tareas visuales, como principio subyacente al aprendizaje de transferencia para ellas. En este artículo, proponemos un marco de inspiración cognitiva, CogtaSkonomy, para aprender taxonomía para las tareas de PNL. El marco consiste en análisis de representación cognitiva (CRA) y mapeo cognitivo-neuronal (CNM). El primero emplea el análisis de similitud representacional, que se usa comúnmente en neurociencia computacional para encontrar una correlación entre la medición de la actividad cerebral y el modelado computacional, para estimar la similitud de tareas con representaciones de oraciones específicas de la tarea. Este último aprende a detectar las relaciones entre tareas mediante la proyección de representaciones neuronales de los modelos de PNL a las señales cognitivas (es decir, vóxeles de IRMf). Los experimentos en 12 tareas de PNL, en los que se utilizan BERT/Tinybert como modelos subyacentes para el aprendizaje de transferencia, demuestran que la COGtaxonomía propuesta es capaz de guiar el aprendizaje de transferencia, logrando un rendimiento competitivo al Proceso de Jerarquía Analítica (Saaty, 1987) utilizado en la taskonomía visual (Zamir et al., 2018) pero sin requerir una transferencia exhaustiva de tareas $O (m^2) $ por pares. Los análisis descubren además que el CNM es capaz de aprender la taxonomía de tareas independiente del modelo.', 'ja': '自然言語処理（ NLP ）のタスク間での転送学習を導く原則はありますか？  タクソノミー（ Zamir et al., 2018 ）は、視覚的なタスクの間に、それらのタスクのための転移学習の基礎となる原理として構造が存在することを発見した。 この論文では、NLPタスクのタクソノミーを学習するために、認知的にインスピレーションを受けたフレームワークであるCogTaskonomyを提案します。 このフレームワークは、認知表現分析（ CRA ）と認知-神経マッピング（ CNM ）で構成されています。 前者は、タスク固有の文章表現とのタスク類似性を推定するために、脳活動度測定と計算モデリングとの間の相関を見つけるために、計算神経科学で一般的に使用される表現類似性分析を使用する。 後者は、ＮＬＰモデルから認知シグナル（すなわち、ｆＭＲＩボクセル）にニューラル表現を投影することによって、タスク関係を検出することを学習する。 BERT/TinyBERTが転送学習の基礎モデルとして使用される12のNLPタスクの実験は、提案されているCogTaxonomyが転送学習を導くことができ、視覚的タスクノミーで使用される分析的階層プロセス（ Saaty、1987 ）と競合するパフォーマンスを達成することを示している（ Zamir et al., 2018 ）が、網羅的なペアワイズ$ O （ m ^ 2 ）$タスク転送を必要としない。 分析はさらに、CNMがモデル非神経タスク分類法を学習することができることを発見する。', 'zh': '自然语言治(NLP)中,有道以教跨职者迁学乎?  分类学(Zamir等,2018)见视任之间有构,以为移学之基。 于本文中,发一见知之框架CogTaskonomy,以学NLP任之分类学。 其框架以知析(CRA)与知 - 神经射(CNM)成。 前者以表相似性论之,此计神经科学之所以求大脑度数建模之相关性,以度事与特定句相似性也。 后以NLP神经表征投识信号(即fMRI体素)以学检事。 12NLP之实验,其BERT / TinyBERT以为迁学之基,明其CogTaxonomy可以导迁学可视化Taskonomy中用析层次结构之(Saaty,1987)比美者(Zamir等,2018),然不须详$O(m^ 2)$移也。 析而见之,CNM能学无关分类法。', 'hi': 'क्या प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) में कार्यों में स्थानांतरण सीखने का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए कोई सिद्धांत है?  वर्गीकरण (Zamir et al., 2018) पाता है कि दृश्य कार्यों के बीच एक संरचना मौजूद है, उनके लिए एक सिद्धांत अंतर्निहित हस्तांतरण सीखने के रूप में। इस पेपर में, हम एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए वर्गीकरण सीखने के लिए एक संज्ञानात्मक रूप से प्रेरित ढांचे, कोगटास्कोनोमी का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। फ्रेमवर्क में संज्ञानात्मक प्रतिनिधित्व विश्लेषिकी (सीआरए) और संज्ञानात्मक-तंत्रिका मानचित्रण (सीएनएम) शामिल हैं। पूर्व प्रतिनिधित्व समानता विश्लेषण को नियोजित करता है, जिसका उपयोग आमतौर पर मस्तिष्क-गतिविधि माप और कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडलिंग के बीच सहसंबंध खोजने के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल तंत्रिका विज्ञान में किया जाता है, ताकि कार्य-विशिष्ट वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ कार्य समानता का अनुमान लगाया जा सके। उत्तरार्द्ध एनएलपी मॉडल से संज्ञानात्मक संकेतों (यानी, एफएमआरआई वोक्सेल) के लिए तंत्रिका प्रतिनिधित्व पेश करके कार्य संबंधों का पता लगाना सीखता है। 12 एनएलपी कार्यों पर प्रयोग, जहां BERT / TinyBERT का उपयोग स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए अंतर्निहित मॉडल के रूप में किया जाता है, यह दर्शाता है कि प्रस्तावित CogTaxonomy स्थानांतरण सीखने का मार्गदर्शन करने में सक्षम है, विश्लेषणात्मक पदानुक्रम प्रक्रिया (सैटी $O, 1987) के लिए प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने में सक्षम है, जिसका उपयोग दृश्य टास्कोनॉमी (ज़मीर एट अल। विश्लेषण आगे पता चलता है कि सीएनएम मॉडल-अज्ञेयवादी कार्य वर्गीकरण सीखने में सक्षम है।', 'ru': 'Существует ли принцип управления обучением передаче между задачами в обработке естественного языка (NLP)?  Таксономия (Zamir et al., 2018) обнаруживает, что среди визуальных задач существует структура, как принцип, лежащий в основе обучения переносу для них. В этой статье мы предлагаем когнитивно вдохновленный фреймворк, CogTaskonomy, для изучения таксономии для задач NLP. Структура состоит из когнитивной репрезентативной аналитики (CRA) и когнитивно-нейронного картографирования (CNM). Первый использует репрезентативный анализ сходства, который обычно используется в вычислительной нейробиологии, чтобы найти корреляцию между измерением мозговой активности и вычислительным моделированием, чтобы оценить сходство задач с конкретными представлениями предложений. Последний учится обнаруживать отношения задач, проецируя нейронные представления от моделей NLP к когнитивным сигналам (т. е. вокселам fMRI). Эксперименты по 12 задачам NLP, где BERT/TinyBERT используются в качестве базовых моделей для обучения переносу, демонстрируют, что предлагаемая CogTaxonomy способна направлять обучение переносу, достигая производительности, конкурентной процессу аналитической иерархии (Saaty, 1987), используемому в визуальной Taskonomy (Zamir et al., 2018), но не требующей исчерпывающей попарной передачи задачи $ O(m^2)$. Анализы далее обнаруживают, что CNM способен изучать модель-диагностическую таксономию задач.', 'ga': 'An bhfuil prionsabal ann chun foghlaim aistrithe a threorú thar thascanna i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha (NLP)? Faigheann tacsanomaíocht (Zamir et al., 2018) amach go bhfuil struchtúr ann i measc na dtascanna amhairc, mar phrionsabal is bonn d’fhoghlaim aistrithe dóibh. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat spreagtha go cognaíoch, CogTaskonomy, chun tacsanomaíocht a fhoghlaim le haghaidh tascanna NLP. Tá an creat comhdhéanta d’Anailísíocht Léiriúcháin Chognaíoch (CRA) agus Mapáil Chognaíoch-Nearach (CNM). Úsáideann an chéad cheann Anailís Cosúlachta Ionadaíochta, a úsáidtear go coitianta i néareolaíocht ríomhaireachtúil chun comhghaol a aimsiú idir tomhas gníomhaíochta inchinne agus samhaltú ríomhaireachtúil, chun cosúlacht tasc le léirithe pianbhreithe tasc-shonracha a mheas. Foghlaimíonn an dara ceann caidreamh tascanna a bhrath trí léiriúcháin néaracha a theilgean ó mhúnlaí NLP go comharthaí cognaíocha (i.e. voxels fMRI). Léiríonn turgnaimh ar 12 thasc NLP, ina n-úsáidtear BERT/TinyBERT mar mhúnlaí bunúsacha don fhoghlaim aistrithe, go bhfuil an CogTaxonomy molta in ann foghlaim aistrithe a threorú, ag baint amach feidhmíochta atá iomaíoch don Phróiseas Ordlathais Anailíseach (Saaty, 1987) a úsáidtear sa Tascanamaíocht amhairc ( Zamir et al., 2018) ach níor ghá an tasc iomlán péirewise $O(m^2)$ a aistriú. Faigheann anailísí amach freisin go bhfuil CNM in ann tacsanomaíocht eiseamláireach-tasc agnostic a fhoghlaim.', 'hu': 'Van-e olyan elv, amely irányítja a tanulás átadását a természetes nyelvi feldolgozás (NLP) feladatai között? A taxonomia (Zamir et al., 2018) megállapítja, hogy a vizuális feladatok között struktúra létezik, mint a transzfertanulás alapelve. Ebben a tanulmányban egy kognitív inspirációs keretrendszert, a CogTaskonomyt javasolunk az NLP feladatok taxonómiájának elsajátítására. A keretrendszer a Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) és a Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM) alkalmazásából áll. Az előbbi a Reprezentációs Hasonlóság Elemzést alkalmazza, amelyet a számítástechnikai idegtudományban gyakran használnak arra, hogy megtalálják az agyi aktivitás mérése és a számítástechnikai modellezés közötti korrelációt, hogy becsüljék a feladat-specifikus mondat reprezentációkkal való hasonlóságot. Ez utóbbi megtanulja felismerni a feladatviszonyokat azáltal, hogy neurális reprezentációkat vetít ki NLP modellekből kognitív jelekre (azaz fMRI voxelekre). 12 NLP feladaton végzett kísérletek, amelyekben a BERT/TinyBERT a transzfertanulás mögöttes modelljeként használják, bebizonyítják, hogy a javasolt CogTaxonómia képes irányítani a transzfertanulást, versenyképes teljesítményt érve el a vizuális Taskonómiában (Zamir et al., 2018), de anélkül, hogy kimerítő páros $O(m^2)$ feladatátvitelt igényelne. Az elemzések továbbá felfedezik, hogy a CNM képes a modell-agnosztikus feladat taxonómia tanulására.', 'el': 'Υπάρχει αρχή για την καθοδήγηση της μάθησης μεταφοράς μεταξύ των εργασιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας; Η Ταξινομία (Ζαμίρ κ.λ., 2018) διαπιστώνει ότι υπάρχει μια δομή μεταξύ των οπτικών εργασιών, ως αρχή που βασίζεται στη μάθηση μεταφοράς για αυτούς. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα γνωστικά εμπνευσμένο πλαίσιο, το CogTaskonomy, για την εκμάθηση ταξινομίας για εργασίες NLP. Το πλαίσιο αποτελείται από την Ανάλυση Γνωσιακής Αντιπροσωπείας (CRA) και τη Γνωσιακή-Νευρική Χαρτογράφηση (CNM). Η πρώτη χρησιμοποιεί την ανάλυση αναπαράστασης ομοιότητας, η οποία χρησιμοποιείται συνήθως στην υπολογιστική νευροεπιστήμη για να βρει μια συσχέτιση μεταξύ μέτρησης εγκεφαλικής δραστηριότητας και υπολογιστικής μοντελοποίησης, για να εκτιμήσει την ομοιότητα εργασιών με αναπαραστάσεις προτάσεων που αφορούν συγκεκριμένες εργασίες. Ο τελευταίος μαθαίνει να ανιχνεύει σχέσεις εργασίας προβάλλοντας νευρωνικές αναπαραστάσεις από μοντέλα σε γνωστικά σήματα (π.χ. βόξελ fMR). Τα πειράματα σε 12-εργασίες όπου χρησιμοποιούνται ως υποκείμενα μοντέλα για τη μάθηση μεταφοράς, καταδεικνύουν ότι η προτεινόμενη Γνωσιακή Ταξινομία είναι σε θέση να καθοδηγήσει τη μάθηση μεταφοράς, επιτυγχάνοντας απόδοση ανταγωνιστική με τη Διαδικασία Αναλυτικής Ιεραρχίας (που χρησιμοποιείται στην οπτική Τακκονομία (κ.α., 2018) αλλά χωρίς να απαιτείται εξαντλητική μεταφορά εργασιών $Ο(m^2)$. Οι αναλύσεις ανακαλύπτουν περαιτέρω ότι το ΚΝΜ είναι ικανό να μάθει την ταξινόμηση προτύπων-αγνωστικής εργασίας.', 'ka': 'არსებობს პრინციპი, რომელსაც გასწავლა ტრანსტრინტის გასწავლა საქმების გარეშე (NLP)? რაკჟონომი (Zamir et al., 2018) აღმოჩნდა, რომ სტრუქტურა ვიზუალური დავალებებში არსებობს, როგორც პრინფუტი, როგორც მათი განსწავლებელი ტრანსტრინტის სწავლებ ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ კონციგურად ინტექსურებული ფრამეტრი, CogTaskonomy, დავისწავლოთ რაქტონომია NLP დავალებისთვის. პარამეტრი არის კოგენტიური რეცენტაციის ანალიტიკების (CRA) და კოგენტიური ნეიროლური მარტიკების (CNM) შექმნა. მხოლოდ გამოყენება განსხვავებული განსხვავებულობის ანალიზია, რომელიც კომპუტაციონალური ნეირომენისთვის გამოყენებულია, რომელიც კომპუტაციონალური ნეირომენისთვის გამოყენებულია, რომელიც ტვინი ბოლოდან დავისწავლია დავალების შესახებ, რომელიც NLP მოდელებიდან კონციგური სიგნალებისთვის პროექტირებით გამოყენება. 12 NLP პარამეტრების გამოყენება, სადაც BERT/TinyBERT გამოყენებულია როგორც გასწავლისთვის გასწავლისთვის მოდელების გამოყენება, გამოყენებული CogTaxonomy შეუძლია გასწავლისთვის გასწავლისთვის გასწავლისთვის, ანალიტიკური hiერაფური პროცესზე (Saaty, 1987) გამოყენებული ვიზუალური რაქონომიში (Zam ანალიზებს დამატებული აღმოჩნევა, რომ CNM შეუძლებელია მოდელ-ადნოსტიკური რაკონომის შესაბამისათვის.', 'it': "Esiste un principio per guidare l'apprendimento di trasferimento tra le attività nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL)? La tassonomia (Zamir et al., 2018) rileva che esiste una struttura tra i compiti visivi, come principio alla base dell'apprendimento di trasferimento per loro. In questo articolo, proponiamo un framework cognitivamente ispirato, CogTaskonomy, per imparare la tassonomia per i compiti NLP. Il framework è costituito da Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) e Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Il primo utilizza l'analisi di somiglianza rappresentativa, che è comunemente usata nelle neuroscienze computazionali per trovare una correlazione tra la misurazione dell'attività cerebrale e la modellazione computazionale, per stimare la somiglianza dei compiti con le rappresentazioni di frasi specifiche del compito. Quest'ultimo impara a rilevare le relazioni di lavoro proiettando rappresentazioni neurali dai modelli NLP ai segnali cognitivi (cioè voxel fMRI). Esperimenti su 12 attività NLP, in cui BERT/TinyBERT sono utilizzati come modelli di base per l'apprendimento di trasferimento, dimostrano che la CogTaxonomy proposta è in grado di guidare l'apprendimento di trasferimento, ottenendo prestazioni competitive rispetto al Processo di Gerarchia Analitica (Saaty, 1987) utilizzato nella Taskonomia visiva (Zamir et al., 2018) ma senza richiedere un esaustivo trasferimento di compiti pari a $O(m^2)$. Le analisi scoprono inoltre che CNM è in grado di apprendere la tassonomia dei compiti agnostici modello-modello.", 'kk': 'Түзіндік тілді өңдеу (NLP) тапсырмаларындағы тапсырмаларды аудару үшін принцип бар ма? Таксономия (Zamir et al., 2018) көрінетін тапсырмалардың арасында құрылымы бар деп ойлады, олар үшін негізгі транспорт оқыту принципі ретінде. Бұл қағазда, NLP тапсырмаларының таксономиясын оқыту үшін, CogTaskonomy- тің көңіл көңілдірілген бағдарламасын қолданамыз. Бағдарлама Cognitive Representative Analytics (CRA) және Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM) болады. Бірінші тапсырманың ұқсастығын бағалау үшін тапсырманың ұқсастығын есептеу неврологиясында қолданылады. Соңғы тапсырма қатынасын NLP үлгілерінен көңіл сигналдарға (мысалы, fMRI вокселдеріне) невралдық түсініктемелерді көрсету арқылы оқыды. 12 NLP тапсырмаларының эксперименттері, жерде BERT/TinyBERT оқыту үшін негізгі үлгілер ретінде қолданылады, CogTaxonomy қолданылатын тапсырмалар оқытуға бағыттау мүмкіндігін көрсетеді, аналитикалық иерархия процессі (Saaty, 1987) көрініс тапсырмаларында қолданылатын аналитикалық тапсырма (Zamir et al., 2018) дегенге қолданылатын,  CNM модель-агностикалық тапсырмалар таксономиясын оқыту мүмкіндігін бақылады.', 'mk': 'Дали постои принцип за водење на пренесувањето на учењето низ задачите во природното обработување јазик (НЛП)? Таксономија (Замир и други, 2018) смета дека постои структура помеѓу визуелните задачи, како принцип на основа на пренесувањето на учењето за нив. Во овој весник предложуваме когнитивно инспирирана рамка, КогТаскономија, за научување на таксономија за задачите на НЛП. Рамката се состои од Когнитивна аналитичка репрезентација (CRA) и Когнитивно-неурално мапирање (CNM). Поранешната користи анализа на репрезентација на сличност, која често се користи во компјутативната невронаука за да се најде корелација помеѓу мерењето на мозокот-активноста и компјутативното моделирање, за да се процени сличноста на задачите со репрезентациите на речениците специфични за задачите Последниот научи да ги детектира врските со задачите со проектирање на нервните претставувања од моделите на НЛП до когнитивните сигнали (т.е., фМРИ воксели). Експериментите на 12 НЛП задачи, каде што БЕРТ/ТИНИБЕРТ се користат како основни модели за трансферентно учење, покажуваат дека предложената КогТаксономија е во можност да го води трансферентното учење, постигнувајќи конкурентни резултати со процесот на аналитичка хиерархија (Saaty, 1987) кој се користи во визуелната Таскономија (Zamir и г. Анализите понатаму откриваат дека СНМ е способна да научи таксономија на модел-агностички задачи.', 'lt': 'Ar yra principas, kuriuo vadovaujamasi mokymosi perkėlimui į gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotis (NLP)? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) finds that a structure exists among visual tasks, as a principle underlying transfer learning for them.  Šiame dokumente siūlome pažinimo įkvepiamą sistemą, CogTaskonomy, mokytis NLP užduočių taksonomijos. Sistemą sudaro Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) ir Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Pirmoji atlieka reprezentacinio panašumo analizę, kuri dažnai naudojama skaičiavimo neuromoksluose, siekiant nustatyti sąsają tarp smegenų aktyvumo matavimo ir skaičiavimo modeliavimo, siekiant įvertinti užduočių panašumą su užduočių konkrečiais sakiniais. Pastarasis mokosi nustatyti užduoči ų santykius, projektuodamas nervinius rodmenis iš NLP modelių į pažintinius signalus (t. y. fMRI vokselius). Eksperimentai 12 NLP užduočių, kuriose BERT/TinyBERT naudojami kaip pagrindiniai mokymosi perdavimu modeliai, rodo, kad siūloma KogTaxonomy gali vadovauti mokymuisi perdavimu, siekdama konkurencingų rezultatų analizės hierarchijos procese (Saaty, 1987), naudojamame vizualinėje Taskonomy sistemoje (Zamir et al., 2018 m.), tačiau nereikalaujant visapusiško poros lygio O(m^2)$ užduočių perdavimo. Be to, analizuojant nustatyta, kad CNM gali mokytis modelio-agnostinės užduočių taksonomijos.', 'ms': 'Adakah terdapat prinsip untuk memimpin pemindahan belajar melalui tugas dalam pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi (NLP)? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) mendapati bahawa struktur wujud diantara tugas visual, sebagai prinsip pemindahan belajar untuk mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka yang diinspirasi secara kognitif, CogTaskonomy, untuk belajar taksonomi untuk tugas NLP. kerangka ini terdiri dari Analisik Perwakilan Cognitif (CRA) dan Petakan Cognitive-Neural (CNM). Sebelumnya menggunakan Analisi Simulasi Perwakilan, yang biasanya digunakan dalam sains saraf komputasi untuk mencari korelasi antara pengukuran aktiviti otak dan pemodelan komputasi, untuk menghargai kesamaan tugas dengan perwakilan kalimat khusus tugas. Yang terakhir belajar untuk mengesan hubungan tugas dengan projek perwakilan saraf dari model NLP ke isyarat kognitif (iaitu voksel fMRI). Eksperimen pada 12 tugas NLP, di mana BERT/TinyBERT digunakan sebagai model as as untuk pembelajaran pemindahan, menunjukkan bahawa CogTaxonomy diusulkan mampu memimpin pembelajaran pemindahan, mencapai prestasi kompetitif ke Proses Hierarki Analitik (Saaty, 1987) digunakan dalam Taskonomy visual (Zamir et al., 2018) tetapi tanpa memerlukan pemindahan tugas $O(m^2)$ secara pasangan yang penuh. Analisis lebih lanjut menemukan bahawa CNM mampu belajar taksonomi tugas model-agnostik.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിന് ഒരു നിയമമു ടാക്സോനോമി (സാമീര്\u200d et al., 2018) കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് കാഴ്ചകളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d ഒരു സ്ഥാനം ഉണ്ടെന്നാണ്, അവര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി മാറ്റുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d കോഗ്ടാസ്കോണിയില്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു, NLP ജോലികള ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പിന്റെ കോണ്\u200dഗ്നിറ്റീവ് പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ അന്യായാലറിക്കുകളും കോഗ്നിറ്റീവ്- നെയുറല്\u200d മാപ്പിങ്ങളും ഉണ്ട മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രതിനിധിയിലെ പ്രതിനിധിയിലെ പോലെയുള്ള അന്യായോജിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d സാധാരണയായി ന്യൂറസിസ്സില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് തലച്ചോറിന്റെ പ NLP മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നും ന്യൂറല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പ്രോജക്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിലൂടെ ജോലിയുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d അവസാനം പഠിക് 12 NLP ജോലികളില്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടി/ടിനിബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ പഠിക്കാനുള്ള മാതൃകങ്ങളായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച കോഗ്ടാക്സോമി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് വഴികാട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നു എന്ന് തെളിയ കൂടുതല്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു സിഎം മോഡല്\u200d -ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക് ജോലി ടാക്സോനോമിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിവുള്ളതെന', 'mt': 'Hemm prinċipju li jiggwida t-trasferiment tat-tagħlim bejn il-kompiti fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP)? It-Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) issib li teżisti struttura fost il-kompiti viżivi, bħal a prinċipju sottostanti għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment għalihom. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas ispirat b’mod konjittiv, CogTaskonomy, biex titgħallem it-tassonomija għall-kompiti tal-NLP. Il-qafas jikkonsisti f’Analiżi tar-Rappreżentanza Konjittiva (CRA) u Mappar tan-Newrali Konjittivi (CNM). L-ewwel juża Analiżi ta’ Similarità Rappreżentattiva, li tintuża b’mod komuni fin-newroxjenza komputattiva biex tinstab korrelazzjoni bejn il-kejl tal-attività tal-moħħ u l-immudellar komputattiv, biex tiġi stmata similarità tal-kompitu mar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi speċifiċi għall-kompitu. Dan tal-aħħar jitgħallem jidentifika r-relazzjonijiet tax-xogħol billi jipprojetta rappreżentazzjonijiet newrali minn mudelli NLP għal sinjali konjittivi (jiġifieri, voxels fMRI). L-esperimenti fuq 12-il kompitu NLP, fejn il-BERT/TinyBERT jintużaw bħala l-mudelli sottostanti għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment, juru li l-CogTaxonomy proposta hija kapaċi tiggwida t-tagħlim tat-trasferiment, li tikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva għall-Proċess ta’ Ġerarkija Analitika (Saaty, 1987) użat fit-Taskonomy viżiva (Zamir et al., 2018) iżda mingħajr ma tirrikjedi trasferiment eżawrjenti ta’ kompitu ta’ $O(m^2)$ par. Analiżi tkompli tiskopri li s-CNM hija kapaċi tagħlim tassonomija tal-kompiti mudell-agnostiċi.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) дээр суралцах үйл ажиллагааг дамжуулах үндсэн зүйл байна уу? Таксономи (Zamir et al., 2018) тэдний хувьд шилжүүлэх сургалтын үндсэн зарчмын нэг бүтэц байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид CogTaskonomy, NLP ажлын taxonomy суралцах ухааны сэтгэл хөтөлбөрийг санал болгож байна. Когнитив Representative Analytics (CRA) болон Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM) үүсгэдэг. Өмнөх нь "Representational Similarity Analysis" шинжилгээг ашигладаг. Энэ нь мэдрэлийн шинжлэх ухаанд тархины үйл ажиллагааны хэмжээг, тооцоололтын модель хоорондын холбоотой байдлыг олохын тулд ашигладаг. Хамгийн сүүлчийн нь ажлын харилцааны холбоотой байдлыг NLP загвараас мэдээллийн сигналууд руу төсөөлж сурсан. НЛП 12 даалгаварын туршилт, BERT/TinyBERT суралцах сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын үндсэн загвар болгон хэрэглэгддэг, CogTaxonomy-ын санал өгсөн талаар сургалтын шилжүүлэлтийг удирдаж чадах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Аналитийн шилжүүлэлтийн үйл ажиллагааны төлөө (Saaty, 1987) хувийн ажиллагааны оном (Zamir et al., 2018) дээр ашигла CNM-ийн загварын агностик ажлын татекономийг сурах боломжтой гэдгийг дахин шинжилгээ хийдэг.', 'pl': 'Czy istnieje zasada kierowania nauką transferową między zadaniami w zakresie przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP)? Taksonomia (Zamir et al., 2018) stwierdza, że wśród zadań wizualnych istnieje struktura, jako zasada leżąca u podstaw nauki transferowej. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy poznawczo inspirowany framework, CogTaskonomy, aby nauczyć się taksonomii dla zadań NLP. Framework składa się z analityki reprezentacji kognitiwnej (CRA) i mapowania kognitiwno-neuronowego (CNM). Pierwszy wykorzystuje analizę podobieństwa reprezentacyjnego, która jest powszechnie stosowana w obliczeniowych neuronaukach, aby znaleźć korelację między pomiarem aktywności mózgu a modelowaniem obliczeniowym, w celu oszacowania podobieństwa zadań z reprezentacjami zdań specyficznych dla zadania. Ten ostatni uczy się wykrywać zależności zadań poprzez projekcję reprezentacji neuronowych z modeli NLP na sygnały poznawcze (tj. voksele fMRI). Eksperymenty na 12-ciu zadaniach NLP, w których BERT/TinyBERT są wykorzystywane jako podstawowe modele uczenia się transferowego, pokazują, że proponowana CogTaxonomy jest w stanie kierować nauką transferową, osiągając wydajność konkurencyjną w stosunku do procesu hierarchii analitycznej (Saaty, 1987) stosowanego w zadaniach wizualnych (Zamir et al., 2018), ale bez wymagania wyczerpującego przenoszenia zadań $O(m^2)$. Analizy odkrywają, że CNM jest w stanie uczyć się taksonomii zadań agnostycznych modelu.', 'no': 'Er det ein prinsipp for å håndtere læring av overføring over oppgåver i naturspråksbehandling (NLP)? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) finn at ein struktur finst blant synlege oppgåver, som ein prinsipp som underlærar overføring for dei. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein kognitivt inspirert rammeverk, CogTaskonomy, for å lære taksonomia for NLP-oppgåver. Rammeverket inneheld av Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) og Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Den tidlegare brukar Representational Similarity Analysis, som vanlegvis vert brukt i computational neuroscience for å finna ein korrelasjon mellom målingar av hjernenaktivitet og datamodellering, for å vurdere tilsvarande oppgåver med oppgåve- spesifikke setningar. Dei siste lærer å oppdaga oppgåveforhold ved å prosjektera neuralrepresentasjonar frå NLP-modeller til kognitiv signaler (t.d. fMRI-vekslar). Eksperimentar på 12 NLP-oppgåver, der BERT/TinyBERT vert brukt som underliggende modeller for å lære overføring, viser at den foreslåde CogTaxonomy kan hjelpa overføringslæringa, og når utføringsprosessen er konkursert til den analytiske hierarkprosessen (Saaty, 1987) som vert brukt i visuelle oppgåveområdet (Zamir et al., 2018) men utan å kreva utløysing av oppgåver $O(m^2)$ med parvis. Analiserer meir oppdaging av at CNM er i stand til å lære modell-agnostisk oppgåve-taxonomi.', 'ro': 'Există un principiu care să ghideze transferul de învățare între sarcini în procesarea limbii naturale (PNL)? Taxonomia (Zamir et al., 2018) constată că există o structură printre sarcinile vizuale, ca principiu care stau la baza învățării transferului pentru acestea. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru inspirat cognitiv, CogTaskonomia, pentru a învăța taxonomia pentru sarcinile PNL. Cadrul constă în Analiza Reprezentării Cognitive (CRA) și Mapping Cognitive-Neural (CNM). Prima utilizează Analiza Similarității Reprezentative, care este utilizată în mod obișnuit în neuroștiințele computaționale pentru a găsi o corelație între măsurarea activității creierului și modelarea computațională, pentru a estima similitudinea sarcinilor cu reprezentările propozițiilor specifice sarcinilor. Acesta din urmă învață să detecteze relațiile de sarcină prin proiectarea reprezentărilor neurale de la modelele PNL la semnalele cognitive (adică voxele fMRI). Experimentele efectuate pe 12 sarcini PNL, în care BERT/TinyBERT sunt utilizate ca modele de bază pentru învățarea transferurilor, demonstrează că CogTaxonomia propusă este capabilă să ghideze învățarea transferurilor, obținând performanțe competitive pentru Procesul de ierarhie analitică (Saaty, 1987) utilizat în Taskonomia vizuală (Zamir et al., 2018), dar fără a necesita transferul exhaustiv de sarcini $O(m^2)$. Analizele descoperă în continuare că CNM este capabil să învețe taxonomia de sarcini model-agnostice.', 'sr': 'Postoji li princip da vodi učenje prevođenja preko zadataka u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP)? Taksonomija (Zamir et al., 2018) smatra da struktura postoji među vizualnim zadacima, kao princip pod učenjem transfer a za njih. U ovom papiru predlažemo kognitivno inspirisani okvir, CogTaskonomy, da naučimo taksonomiju za zadatak NLP-a. Okvir se sastoji od analitika kognitivnog predstavljanja (CRA) i kognitivnog neuronskog mapiranja (CNM). Bivša zapošljava analizu predstavne sličnosti, koja se uobičajeno koristi u kompjuterskoj neuronauci kako bi pronašla korelaciju između mjerenja mozga-aktivnosti i kompjuterskog modela, kako bi procenila sličnost zadatka sa predstavljanjem rečenica za određene zadatke. Posljednji se nauèi da otkriju veze sa zadatkom projekcijom neuralnih predstavljanja iz modela NLP-a na kognitivne signale (tj. fMRI vokse). Eksperimenti o 12 zadataka NLP-a, gde se BERT/TinyBERT koristi kao temeljni modeli za učenje prijenosa, pokazuju da je predložena KogTaxonomija u mogućnosti da vodi učenje prijenosa, ostvariti konkurentnost za provedbu analitičkog hijerarhijskog procesa (Saaty, 1987) koji se koristi u vizualnoj Taskonomiji (Zamir et al., 2018) ali bez zahteva da prebaci izvršne pare $ O(m^2)$ zadatak. Analizira dalje otkriće da je CNM sposoban da uči taksonomiju modela-agnostičkih zadataka.', 'sv': 'Finns det någon princip för att vägleda överföring av lärande mellan uppgifter inom naturlig språkbehandling (NLP)? Taxonomi (Zamir et al., 2018) finner att det finns en struktur bland visuella uppgifter, som en princip bakom transferlärande för dem. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett kognitivt inspirerat ramverk, CogTaskonomy, för att lära sig taxonomi för NLP-uppgifter. Ramverket består av Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) och Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Den förstnämnda använder Representational Similarity Analysis, som vanligtvis används inom beräkningsnedvetenskap för att hitta en korrelation mellan hjärnaktivitetsmätning och beräkningsmodellering, för att uppskatta uppgifts likhet med uppgiftsspecifika meningsrepresentationer. Den senare lär sig att upptäcka uppgiftsrelationer genom att projicera neurala representationer från NLP-modeller till kognitiva signaler (dvs fMRI-voxels). Experiment på 12 NLP-uppgifter, där BERT/TinyBERT används som underliggande modeller för transferinlärning, visar att den föreslagna CogTaxonomy kan vägleda transferinlärning och uppnå prestanda som är konkurrenskraftig mot den analytiska hierarkiprocessen (Saaty, 1987) som används i visuell taskonomi (Zamir et al., 2018) men utan att kräva uttömmande parvis $O(m^2)$ uppgiftsöverföring. Analyser upptäcker vidare att CNM kan lära sig modell-agnostisk uppgifts taxonomi.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය (NLP) වලින් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සමඟ ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවද? ටැක්සෝනෝමි (Zamir et al., 2018) හොයාගන්නවා දර්ශණ වැඩක් අතර ඉන්නවා කියලා, ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරධානයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරධානයක් වි මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා නිල්ප් වැඩක් සඳහා කොග් ටැස්කෝස්ටෝකනෝමිකයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්න. කොන්ජිනිත් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය විශේෂය (CRA) සහ කොන්ජිනිත්-න්\u200dයුරාල් මැපින්ග් එක (CNM) වල ඉන්නවා. මුලින් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයක් භාවිත කරනවා, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණය න්\u200dයුරෝවිස්තානයෙන් භාවිත කරනවා මොළුවේ  අන්තිමයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා වැඩ සම්බන්ධතාවක් හොයාගන්න, NLP මොඩේල් වලින් නිර්මාණය සංඥාන සංඥාවක් වලින්. The examples on 12 NLP Jobs, where BERT/TinyBERT are Used as the underlie Model for Transfer Training, show that the advised CogTaxyOmy is can lead Transfer Training, achiachiaching Perfective Competitive to the Annalitic hirarchy process (Saaty, 1987) Used in Visal Job Nomy (Zamir et al., 2018) but not needed exhAustrive parewise $O(m^2)$ job Transferring. තව විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා CNM එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'so': 'Ma jiraa qaynuun lagu hago waxbarashada lagu wareejiyo shaqooyinka lagu sameeyo afka asalka ah (NLP??) Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) wuxuu ogaadaa in dhismo ku dhex jira shaqaalaha aragtida, taas oo ah khalad ka hooseeya waxbarashada la wareejiyo. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal aad u waxyoonay, CogTaskonomy, si aan u barno canshuuraha shaqada NLP. Qoraalka waxaa ka mid ah Aqoonsive Representation Analytics (CRA) iyo Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Shaqooyihii hore wuxuu u shaqeeyaa wax u eg Analysis, kaas oo inta badan lagu isticmaalaa cilmiga neuro-xisaabta si uu u helo xiriir u dhexeeya qiyaastiga waxqabadka maskaxda iyo tusaalaha xisaabta, si uu u qiimeeyo wax u eg shaqo qayb gaar ah. Qofkii dambe wuxuu baranayaa inay ogaato xiriirka shaqada marka lagu soo bandhigi karo noocyada neurada e e NLP-ka si ay u hesho calaamadaha aqoonsiga (tusaale ahaan fMRI voxels). Imtixaan ku qoran 12 NLP shaqooyin, where BERT/TinyBERT looga isticmaali karo sida model hoose u ah ee waxbarashada, waxay muujin kartaa in la soo jeediyo CogTaxonomy uu awoodo in uu ku hago waxbarasho, achin performance competitive with the Analytic Hierarchy Process (Saaty, 1987) used in visual Taskonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) laakiin aan u baahnayn labaad oo daal ah $O(m^2)$ safarka. Analys dheeraad ah wuxuu ogaanayaa in CNM uu awoodo in uu awoodo in uu wax barayo canshuuraha qaababka sameynta ee shaqada.', 'ta': 'இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் கற்றல் முழுவதும் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் ஒரு விதிமுறை இருக்கிறதா? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) finds that a structure exists among visual tasks, as a principle underlying transfer learning for them.  இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் அறிவில்லாத ஆர்வமான சட்டத்தில், CogTaskonomy, NLP பணிகளுக்கு வரிசைப்படுத்தலை கற்றுக்கொள்ள முன்ன இந்த சட்டத்தில் குறிப்பிடும் பிரதிநியாயமான ஆராய்ச்சி( CRA) மற்றும் குறிப்பிடு- நெயுரல் வரைப்படம் (CNM) உள்ளது. மூளை செயல் அளவும் கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரி மாதிரியிலும் ஒரு இணைய தொடர்பை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படும் முன்னோர் பிரதிநிதியான ஒத்திசையான விளக்கம், செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட வாக NLP மாதிரிகளில் இருந்து புதிய பிரதிநிதிகளை குறிக்கும் குறியீடு 12 NLP பணிகளில் BERT/TinyBERT பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள அடிப்படையான கற்றுக்கான மாதிரிகளாக, தெரிவிக்கும் போது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட CogTaxonomy கல்வியை மாற்ற முடியும், பார்வையான Taskonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆனால் தோற்றமான ஜோடி O(m^2) பண CNM மாதிரி-ஆராய்ச்சி பணி வரிசையில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள முடியும் என்பதை மேலும் ஆய்வு செய்கிறது.', 'ur': 'کیا نئی زبان پردازی (NLP) میں کاموں کے درمیان تغییر یادگاری کی راہ دکھانے کے لئے ایک قانون ہے؟ تاکسنومی (Zamir et al., 2018) دیکھتا ہے کہ ایک ساختار نظر کے کاموں میں موجود ہے، جو ان کے لئے تغییر سیکھ رہے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے NLP کے کاموں کے لئے تاکسنومی کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے ایک پیغمبر کے ذریعہ پیدا کیا ہے، CogTaskonomy. اس فرم میں Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) اور Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM) سے ہے. اس سے پہلے مغز کی فعالیت اندازے اور کمپیوٹریشن موڈلینگ کے درمیان تعلق کا استعمال کرتا ہے، جو کام کی تعلق کے مطابق مطابق کے مطابق کامپیوتر کی موڈلینگ کے مطابق کامپیوتر کی مطابق ہے۔ پچھلوں نے کام رابطہ شناسایا کرنا سکھایا ہے کہ NLP موڈل سے نئورل نمائندوں کو معلوم سیگنالوں تک (یعنی fMRI وکسل) کی پروژیک کریں۔ 12 NLP تاسکیوں کی آزمائش، جہاں BERT/TinyBERT کو انتقال کی تعلیم کے لئے بنیادی موڈل کے طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی CogTaxonomy قادر ہے انتقال کی تعلیم کی راہ دکھانے کی طاقت کرسکتی ہے، تحلیلی آئرچی پروسس (Saaty, 1987) کے لئے مطابق بصیرت تاسکینومی (Zamir et al., 2018) میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، لیکن بغیر اس کے کہ اضافہ جسمانی ڈالر اور اچھی بات کا تحقیق کرتا ہے کہ CNM موڈل-agnostic تاکسنومی کی سیکھنے کے قابل ہے.', 'uz': "Asosiy tilni boshqarish vazifalarini o'rganish qoidasi mavjud emas? Taxonomi (Zamir et al., 2018) ularga o'rganish asosiy o'rganish asosiy, ko'rinish vazifalarga bir tuzilishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz NLP vazifalarini o'rganish uchun kogTaskonomi, kogTaskonomi, taxonomni o'rganish uchun foydalanamiz. Freymning chegarasi (CRA) va kognitiv neyural diagrammatika (CNM) boʻladi. Oldingi tashkilotni Animatsiya Analysis qiladi. U oddiy kompyuterning neyron ilmosida ishlatiladi, miya- aktiviyatlarni o'zgartirish va kompyuterning modelini o'rganish uchun, vazifani tashkilotga tayyorlash va vazifaning xususiyatlari bilan birlashtirish uchun. Name 12 NLP vazifalarda BERT/TinyBERT o'rganish uchun asosiy modeli sifatida ishlatiladi. KogTaxonomi o'rganishni o'rganish, o'rganishni o'rganish, o'zgartirishni o'rganish, o'zgartirish imkoniyatini ko'rinish Taskonomiga (Zamir et al, 2018) ishlatishga yetarlicha bo'ladi. CNM model-agnostik vazifalar taxonomini o'rganish imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Có một nguyên tắc hướng dẫn việc chuyển tiếp học qua các công việc trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP)? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 208) phát hiện rằng có một cấu trúc nằm trong các nhiệm vụ hình ảnh, là một nguyên tắc dẫn đến việc học chuyển nhượng cho họ. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống nhạy cảm, CogTaskonomy, để học taxonomy cho công việc Njala. Bộ khung bao gồm phân tích thần kinh bén (CRA) và rối trí thần kinh bén (CNM). The previous occupies Represental Similaty Analysis, which is commonly used in tính so computen Neutation so sánh between brain-activity đo lường and computetive modelling, to ước lượng y hệt khớp khớp với trình bày Án đặc biệt. Người này học cách phát hiện quan hệ nhiệm vụ bằng cách phát triển các biểu đồ thần kinh từ mẫu NLP tới tín hiệu nhận thức (v.d., fMRI voxels). Thử nghiệm với 12 NLP, nơi BERT/TinyBERT được dùng làm phương pháp nghiên cứu cơ bản để học chuyển nhượng, chứng minh rằng CogTaxonomy có khả năng hướng dẫn học chuyển nhượng, đạt được năng suất cạnh tranh với Tiến trình phân tích Hieraduyệt (Saaty, 1987) được dùng trong lĩnh vực giám sát Taskonomy (Zapir et., 208) nhưng không cần ghép đầy đủ các khớp (m/m/2),"chuyển nhiệm vụ. Phân tích thêm khám phá rằng CNM có khả năng học phân loại công việc bồ đà.', 'bg': 'Има ли принцип за насочване на трансферното обучение между задачите по обработка на естествения език (НЛП)? Таксономията (Замир и др., 2018) установява, че между визуалните задачи съществува структура, като принцип в основата на трансферното обучение за тях. В настоящата статия предлагаме коgnitively вдъхновена рамка, за да се научи таксономия за задачи от НЛП. Рамката се състои от Анализ на когнитивното представяне (КРА) и когнитивно-неврално картографиране (КНМ). Първият използва Representational Similarity Analysis, който често се използва в изчислителната невронаука, за да се намери корелация между измерването на мозъчната активност и изчислителното моделиране, за да се оцени сходството на задачите със специфичните за задачата изображения на изречения. Последният се научава да открива връзките със задачите, като проектира невронни изображения от модели на НЛП към когнитивни сигнали (т.е. воксели на ММР). Експерименти по 12 задачи от НЛП, при които се използват като основни модели за трансферно обучение, показват, че предложената КогТаксономия е в състояние да насочва трансферното обучение, постигайки резултати конкурентни на Аналитичния йерархичен процес (Саати, 1987), използван във визуалната таскономия (Замир и др., 2018), но без да изисква изчерпателно прехвърляне на задачи по двойки. Анализите откриват, че е способен да изучава таксономия на задачите с агностика на модела.', 'de': 'Gibt es ein Prinzip, das Transferlernen über Aufgaben in der Natural Language Processing (NLP) hinweg lenkt? Taxonomie (Zamir et al., 2018) stellt fest, dass eine Struktur unter visuellen Aufgaben existiert, als ein Prinzip, das Transferlernen für sie zugrunde liegt. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein kognitiv inspiriertes Framework vor, CogTaskonomy, um Taxonomie für NLP-Aufgaben zu erlernen. Das Framework besteht aus Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) und Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Ersteres verwendet Representational Similarity Analysis, die häufig in der Computerneurowissenschaft verwendet wird, um eine Korrelation zwischen Messung der Gehirnaktivität und Computermodellierung zu finden, um die Ähnlichkeit von Aufgaben mit aufgabenspezifischen Satzdarstellungen zu schätzen. Letzteres lernt, Aufgabenbeziehungen zu erkennen, indem es neuronale Repräsentationen von NLP-Modellen auf kognitive Signale (d.h. fMRT-Voxel) projiziert. Experimente an 12-NLP-Aufgaben, bei denen BERT/TinyBERT als zugrunde liegende Modelle für Transferlernen verwendet wird, zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene CogTaxonomie in der Lage ist, Transferlernen zu steuern und Leistung zu erzielen, die mit dem Analytischen Hierarchieprozess (Saaty, 1987) in der visuellen Taskonomie (Zamir et al., 2018) konkurriert ist, ohne jedoch eine umfassende paarweise $O(m^2)$ Aufgabenübertragung erfordert. Analysen zeigen weiter, dass CNM in der Lage ist, modellagnostische Tasktaxonomie zu erlernen.', 'nl': 'Is er een principe om transfer learning te begeleiden tussen taken in Natural Language Processing (NLP)? Taxonomie (Zamir et al., 2018) stelt vast dat er een structuur bestaat tussen visuele taken, als uitgangspunt voor transferleren. In dit artikel stellen we een cognitief geïnspireerd raamwerk voor, CogTaskonomy, om taxonomie te leren voor NLP-taken. Het framework bestaat uit Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) en Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). De eerste maakt gebruik van Representational Similarity Analysis, die algemeen wordt gebruikt in de computerneurowetenschappen om een correlatie te vinden tussen hersenactiviteitsmeting en computermodellering, om de gelijkenis van taken met taakspecifieke zinnrepresentaties te schatten. Deze laatste leert taakverelaties te detecteren door neurale representaties van NLP modellen te projecteren naar cognitieve signalen (d.w.z. fMRI voxels). Experimenten met 12 NLP-taken, waarbij BERT/TinyBERT wordt gebruikt als onderliggende modellen voor transfer learning, tonen aan dat de voorgestelde CogTaxonomy in staat is om transfer learning te begeleiden en prestaties te behalen die concurreren met het analytische hiërarchieproces (Saaty, 1987) dat wordt gebruikt in visuele taskonomie (Zamir et al., 2018), maar zonder uitputtende pairwise $O(m^2)$ taakverdracht te vereisen. Analyses ontdekken verder dat CNM in staat is om model-agnostische taaktaxonomie te leren.', 'da': 'Er der et princip, der kan vejlede overførsel af læring på tværs af opgaver i naturlig sprogbehandling (NLP)? Taxonomi (Zamir et al., 2018) finder, at der eksisterer en struktur blandt visuelle opgaver, som et princip bag transferlæring for dem. I denne artikel foreslår vi en kognitivt inspireret ramme, CogTaskonomy, til at lære taksonomi for NLP-opgaver. Rammerne består af Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) og Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Førstnævnte anvender Representational Similarity Analysis, som almindeligvis anvendes i beregningsmæssig neurovidenskab til at finde en korrelation mellem hjerneaktivitetsmåling og beregningsmæssig modellering, til at estimere opgavens lighed med opgavespecifikke sætningsrepræsentationer. Sidstnævnte lærer at detektere opgaveforhold ved at projicere neurale repræsentationer fra NLP modeller til kognitive signaler (dvs. fMRI voxels). Eksperimenter med 12 NLP-opgaver, hvor BERT/TinyBERT anvendes som de underliggende modeller for overførselslæring, viser, at den foreslåede CogTaxonomi er i stand til at styre overførselslæring og opnå ydeevne konkurrencedygtige i forhold til den analytiske hierarki proces (Saaty, 1987), der anvendes i visuel Taskonomi (Zamir et al., 2018), men uden at kræve udtømmende parrede $O(m^2)$ opgaveoverførsel. Analyser opdager yderligere, at CNM er i stand til at lære model-agnostisk opgavetassonomi.', 'hr': 'Postoji li načelo da vodi učenje prijenosa preko zadataka u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP)? Taksonomija (Zamir et al., 2018) smatra da struktura postoji među vizualnim zadacima, kao princip temeljnog učenja prijenosa za njih. U ovom papiru predlažemo kognitivno inspirirani okvir, CogTaskonomy, naučiti taksonomiju za zadatke NLP-a. Okvir se sastoji od analitika kognitivnog predstavljanja (CRA) i kognitivnog neuronskog mapiranja (CNM). Bivša zapošljava analizu predstavne sličnosti, koja se uobičajeno koristi u računalnoj neuronauci kako bi pronašla korelaciju između mjerenja aktivnosti mozga i računalnog modela, kako bi procijenila sličnost zadatka s predstavljanjem određene kazne za zadatak. Posljednji se uči otkriti zadaćne odnose projekcijom neuralnih predstavljanja iz modela NLP-a do kognitivnih signala (tj. fMRI povraćanja). Eksperimenti o 12 zadatka NLP-a, gdje se BERT/TinyBERT koristi kao temeljni modeli za učenje prijenosa, pokazuju da je predložena CogTaxonomija u mogućnosti voditi učenje prijenosa, ostvariti konkurentnost učinka na analitički hijerarhijski proces (Saaty, 1987) koji se koristi u vizualnoj Taskonomiji (Zamir et al., 2018), ali bez zahtjeva izvršnog prejenosa zadataka O(m^2)$ na pare. Analizira dalje otkriće da je CNM sposoban učiti taksonomiju modela agnostičkog zadatka.', 'id': 'Apakah ada prinsip untuk memimpin transfer belajar melalui tugas dalam proses bahasa alami (NLP)? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) menemukan bahwa struktur ada diantara tugas visual, sebagai prinsip pendidikan transfer belajar untuk mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan terinspirasi kognitif, CogTaskonomy, untuk belajar taksonomi untuk tugas NLP. Bingkai-bingkai terdiri dari Analis Perwakilan Cognitif (CRA) dan Peta Cognitif-Neural (CNM). Sebelumnya menggunakan Analisi Persamaan Perwakilan, yang biasanya digunakan dalam ilmu saraf komputasi untuk menemukan korelasi antara pengukuran aktivitas otak dan model komputasi, untuk memperkirakan persamaan tugas dengan represensi kalimat spesifik tugas. Yang terakhir belajar untuk mendeteksi hubungan tugas dengan memproyeksikan representation saraf dari model NLP ke sinyal kognitif (i.e., voksel fMRI). Eksperimen pada 12 tugas NLP, di mana BERT/TinyBERT digunakan sebagai model dasar untuk belajar transfer, menunjukkan bahwa CogTaxonomy yang diusulkan mampu memimpin belajar transfer, mencapai prestasi kompetitif untuk Proses Hierarki Analitik (Saaty, 1987) digunakan dalam Taskonomy visual (Zamir et al., 2018) tetapi tanpa memerlukan pemindahan tugas $O(m^2)$ secara pasangan melelahkan. Analisa lebih lanjut menemukan bahwa CNM mampu belajar model-agnostik tugas taksonomi.', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리(NLP)에서 크로스 퀘스트 이동 학습을 지도하는 원칙이 있습니까?분류학(Zamir et al., 2018)에서 시각 임무 사이에 하나의 구조가 존재하는 것을 발견했는데 이것은 시각 임무 이동 학습의 기본 원리이다.본고에서 우리는 인지적 계발을 받는 프레임워크인 CogTaskonomy를 제시하여 NLP 임무의 분류법을 배웠다.이 프레임은 인지표징분석(CRA)과 인지신경매핑(CNM)으로 구성됐다.전자는 계산신경과학에서 자주 사용하는 표징 유사성 분석을 이용하여 대뇌 활동 측정과 계산 모델링 간의 상관성을 발견하고 임무가 특정한 문장 표징으로 임무의 유사성을 평가한다.후자는 NLP 모델의 신경 표징을 인지 신호(즉 기능자공진체소)에 투사함으로써 검측 임무 관계를 학습한다.12개의 NLP 임무(그중 버트/티니버트가 전이 학습의 기초 모델로 사용됨)에 대한 실험에 따르면 제시된 CogTaxonomy는 전이 학습을 지도하고 시각 임무 분류법(Zamir et al., 2018)에서 사용된 차원 분석법(Saaty, 1987)과 경쟁하는 성능을 실현할 수 있으나 철저한 $O(m^2)$임무 이전은 필요 없다.분석에 의하면 CNM은 모델 불가지 임무 분류법을 배울 수 있다.', 'af': "Is daar 'n prinsipe om oordrag te lei oor taak in natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP)? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) vind dat 'n struktuur bestaan onder visuele opdragte, as 'n prinsipe ondersteunde oordrag leer vir hulle. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n kognitief inspireerde raamwerk, CogTaskonomy om taxonomie te leer vir NLP-opdragte. Die raamwerk bestaan van Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) en Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Die vorige gebruik Representational Similarity Analysis, wat gewoonlik gebruik word in rekenasielike neuroscience om 'n korrelasie tussen brein-aktiviteit-measurement en rekenasielike modellering te vind, om taak gelykenis te estimateer met taak-spesifieke voorstellings. Die laaste leer om taak verhouding te ontdek deur die projeksie van neural e voorstellings van NLP modele na kognitiewe signale (bv. fMRI voksels). Eksperimente op 12 NLP-opdragte, waar BERT/TinyBERT gebruik word as die onderstelling modele vir oordra-leer, vertoon dat die voorgestelde CogTaxonomy kan lei oordra-leer, aanvaardig uitvoer-konkursief tot die Analytiese Hierarchy-Proses (Saaty, 1987) gebruik word in visuele taaksonomie (Zamir et al., 2018) maar sonder om uitvoer pare $O(m^2)$ taak oordra te bring. Analiseer verdere ontdekking dat CNM kan leer model-agnostiese taak taxonomie.", 'sw': 'Je, kuna kanuni ya kuongoza kuhamisha kujifunza katika kazi za lugha za asili (NLP??) Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) anagundua kuwa muundo unapo kati ya kazi za kuona, kama kanuni ya kuhamisha kujifunza kwao. In this paper, we propose a cognitively inspired framework, CogTaskonomy, to learn taxonomy for NLP tasks.  Mfumo unajumuisha uchambuzi wa Mahakilishi (CRA) na Ramani ya Kitambua ya Neural (CNM). Uchambuzi wa zamani wa Umoja wa Wakwakilisha, ambao mara nyingi hutumiwa katika sayansi ya ubongo ya hisabati ili kutafuta uhusiano kati ya upasuaji wa shughuli za ubongo na mifano ya kompyuta, kuhesabu kazi sawa na uwakilishi wa hukumu maalum. Baadae ya pili wanajifunza kutambua mahusiano ya kazi kwa kuandaa wawakilishi wa neura kutoka mifano ya NLP hadi ishara za ujuzi (yaani voxeli za fMRI). Majaribio kwenye kazi 12 za NLP, ambapo BERT/TinyBERT inatumika kama mifano ya msingi kwa ajili ya kuhamisha elimu, yanaonyesha kuwa pendekezo la CogTaxonomy inaweza kuongoza kujifunza, kupata ufanisi wa ushindani katika mchakato wa Ujadala wa Ujadala (Saaty, 1987) uliotumika katika Taskonomy (Zamir et, 2018) lakini bila kutaka mpango wa dola za dola za Kimarekani(m^2). Anachambua zaidi kutambua kuwa CNM ina uwezo wa kujifunza kodronomy ya kazi za kigaidi.', 'tr': 'Doýal dil işlemeginde öwrenmek üçin bir prinsip barmy? Taksonomiýa (Zamir et al., 2018) görsel zadlaryň arasynda bir struktur bar diýip pikir edýär. Bu kagyzda, CogTaskonomy, NLP işleri üçin taksowy öwrenmek üçin bilim alçan bir çerçew teklip edýäris. Bu çerçeve Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) and Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM) tarafından oluşur. Öňki Taýdalyk Taýdalyk Taýdalyklygyny ulanýar, hem bu hemişe kompýuter neurologiýasynda beyin-aktiwitet ölçüsi we kalkular modelleri arasynda bir whakarlaýyş tapmak üçin ulanylýar. Soňky görnüş baglaýyşlaryny NLP modellerinden tanyş signallere (meselâ, fMRI voksellere) tarapyndan taslaýarak öwrenýär. 12 NLP netijesinden örän provermeler, nirede BERT/TinyBERT öwrenmek üçin esasy nusgalar bolup ulanylýar, CogTaxonomiň teklip edilen göçüp öwrenmek üçin ýoly gurlap biljek bolandygyny görkez, Görnüş Taýruky Prozesine (Saat, 1987) Görnüş Taýramy (Zamir et al., 2018) ullanýan çykyş işlerine terjime edilen çykyş, $O(m^2)$ täze bir çift taýýarlama gerek bolýar. CNM-iň nusgasyny agnostik täblisaň taksowadyny öwrenmegi başarýar.', 'am': 'በአዳማዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት ውስጥ ትምህርትን ለመቀበል የሚችል የህግ ክፍል አለን? ታክሲኖም (ዛሚር et al., 2018) የራእይ ስርዓቶች ውስጥ መሠረት እንዳለ፣ ለራሳቸው የመለስ ትምህርት መሆኑን እንደሚገኘው ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የNLP ስራዎችን ለመማር በብልሃት የሚታወቀውን የኮgTaskonomi ፍሬማር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ The framework consists of Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) and Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM).  የቀድሞው ብጤናዊ Analysis፣ በሐሳብ-አካባቢ እና በቁጥጥር አካባቢ መካከል ግንኙነት ለመግኘት የሚጠቀሙትን የቆጣጠርን አካባቢ እና አካባቢ ምሳሌ ለመገኘት፣ ስራውን በትክክል ስርዓት በተለዩት የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ለመቆጣጠር የሚጠይቅ ነው፡፡ የመጨረሻው የስራ ግንኙነት አካባቢዎች ከNLP ሞዴላዎችን ለመግለጥ ይማራሉ፡፡ በ12 NLP ስራ ውስጥ BERT/TinyBERT በመቀናኘት የሚጠቀሙበት የውይይት መተማር model፣ በተዘጋጀው የኮgTaxonomy ትምህርት ማቀናቀል፣ የድምፅ ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል፣ በተቃውሞ ትዕዛዝ (Saaty, 1987) በተጠቃሚ ታስኮኖሚ (ዛሚር እና al., 2018) ነገር ግን የደካማ ሁለት ዶላር (m^2) ስራ ለመዘዋወር የማይችል ነው፡፡ የCNM model-agnostic ስራ ክፍተት መማር ሊችል የሚችል እንደሆነ ሌላውን ያስተምረዋል፡፡', 'sq': 'A ka ndonjë parim për të udhëzuar transferimin e mësimit nëpërmjet detyrave në procesimin natyror të gjuhës (NLP)? Taxonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) gjen se një strukturë ekziston midis detyrave vizuale, si një parim themelor për mësimin e transferit për ta. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një kuadër të frymëzuar në mënyrë kognitive, CogTaskonomy, për të mësuar taksonominë për detyrat e NLP. Korniza përbëhet nga Analitika e Përfaqësimit Kujtues (CRA) dhe hartimi Kujtues-Neural (CNM). Ishte përdorur Analizën e ngjashmërisë Përfaqësuese, e cila përdoret zakonisht në neuroshkencën llogaritare për të gjetur një korrelacion midis matjes së aktivitetit të trurit dhe modelimit llogaritar, për të vlerësuar ngjashmërinë e detyrës me përfaqësimet e fjalëve specifike për detyrën. E fundit mëson të zbulojë marrëdhëniet me detyrat duke projektuar përfaqësime nervore nga modelet NLP në sinjalet kognitive (pra, vokselët fMRI). Experiments on 12 NLP tasks, where BERT/TinyBERT are used as the underlying models for transfer learning, demonstrate that the proposed CogTaxonomy is able to guide transfer learning, achieving performance competitive to the Analytic Hierarchy Process (Saaty, 1987) used in visual Taskonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) but without requiring exhaustive pairwise $O(m^2)$ task transferring.  Analizon më tej zbulon se CNM është në gjendje të mësojë taksonominë e detyrave model-agnostike.', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունի՞ սկզբունք սովորելու փոխանցման ուղղությամբ բնական լեզվի վերամշակում (ՆԼՊ)։ Տաքսոնամիան (Zamir et al., 2018) հայտնաբերում է, որ կառուցվածք գոյություն ունի տեսողական խնդիրների միջև, որպես սկզբունք, որը հիմնականում է նրանց փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ճանաչողական ոգեշնչված շրջանակ, Կոգ Թասկոնոմիա, դասակարգ սովորելու համար ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների համար: Համակարգը կազմված է Կոնիտիվ ներկայացման վերլուծությունից (ԿՌԱ) և Կոնիտիվ-նեյրոնալ քարտեզագրությունից (ԿՆՄ). Առաջինը օգտագործում է ենթադրական նմանության վերլուծություն, որը հաճախ օգտագործվում է հաշվարկների նյարդաբանության մեջ ուղեղի ակտիվության չափումների և հաշվարկների մոդելների միջև կապ գտնելու համար, խնդրի նմանության գնահատելու համար խնդրի հատուկ նախադասությունների ներկայացումների հետ: Վերջինը սովորում է հայտնաբերել աշխատանքային հարաբերությունները, պրոյեկտելով նյարդային ներկայացումներ ՆԼՊ մոդելներից մինչև ճանաչողական ազդանշաններ (թ. 12 ՆԼՊ-ի առաջադրանքների փորձարկումները, որտեղ BER-ը և ԹինիԲերթը օգտագործվում են որպես փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության հիմնական մոդելներ, ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած ԿոգՏաքսոնամիան կարողանում է ղեկավարել փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը, հասնելով արդյունավետության մրցակցությունը վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ գործընթացին (Սաատի, 1987), որը օգտագործվում է տես Հետևաբար վերլուծում է, որ CNM-ը կարողանում է սովորել մոդել-ագնոստիկ խնդիրների տաքսոնոմիան:', 'az': 'Doğal dil işləməsində öyrənmək öyrənməsi üçün bir prinsip var mı? Taksonomiya (Zamir et al., 2018) onların öyrənməsinin bir prinsipi olaraq görsel işlər arasında bir quruluş var. Bu kağızda, CogTaskonomy, NLP işlərinin taxonomiya öyrənməsini təklif edirik. Çerçive Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) və Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM) içindədir. Əvvəlki nürol bilimi, beyin-fəaliyyəti ölçüsi və hesaplama modelləri arasındakı bir bağlantı tapmaq üçün, işin müəyyən edilmiş cümlələr ilə bənzərini hesablamaq üçün təqdim edən Representational Similarity Analizi istifadə edir. Sonrakılar NLP modellərindən nöral göstəriciləri kognitiv sinyallərə (i.e. fMRI səslərə) təşkil edib i şin əlaqələrini keşfetməyi öyrənir. 12 NLP işlərində, BERT/TinyBERT öyrənmək üçün əsas modellər kimi istifadə edildiyi təcrübələrin CogTaxonomy öyrənməsini doğru yola yönəldər, Gözlü Taskonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) ilə istifadə edilən Analytic Hierarchy Process (Saaty, 1987) ilə m üqayisədə istifadə ediləni təcrübə edə bilər, amma tamamlayıcı cüt $O(m^2)$ işləri tərəfindən istifadə etmədən istifadə edə bilər. CNM modeli-agnostik işin taxonomiya öyrənə biləcəyini daha çox analiz edir.', 'fa': 'آیا یک اصل برای راهنمایی یادگیری از روی کار های زبان طبیعی (NLP) وجود دارد؟ تاکسوني (Zamir et al., 2018) فهميد که ساختاري بين کار هاي بينايي وجود داره، به عنوان principle underlying transfer learning for them. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ چهارچوب (CRA) و نقشه\u200cسازی\u200cهای عصبی Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM) است. سابق تحلیل شبیه\u200cسازی نماینده\u200cای را استفاده می\u200cکند، که معمولاً در علم عصبی\u200cسازی برای پیدا کردن ارتباطی بین اندازه\u200cسازی فعالیت مغز و مدل\u200cسازی کامپیوتری استفاده می\u200cشود، تا مشابه\u200cسازی کار با نمایش\u200cسازی\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای خاص\u200cکار آخرین یاد می\u200cگیرد که رابطه\u200cهای کار را با پروژه\u200cسازی نمایش\u200cهای عصبی از مدل NLP به سیگنال\u200cهای شناخته (یعنی صدای fMRI) کشف کند. تجربه\u200cهای ۱۲ کار NLP، جایی که BERT/TinyBERT به عنوان مدل\u200cهای پایه\u200cای برای یادگیری انتقال استفاده می\u200cشوند، نشان می\u200cدهند که پیشنهاد CogTaxonomy قادر است که یادگیری انتقال را هدایت کند، به رسیدن رقابت عملکرد با پروسه\u200cی تحقیقات تحقیقاتی (Saaty, 1987) استفاده می\u200cشود در توسعه\u200cشناسی دیده (Zamir et al., 2018) ولی بدون نیازی به انتقال کردن وظیفه\u200cی تحلیل می\u200cکند که CNM قادر به یادگیری تاکسونومی کار مدل-agnostic است.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় কোন কাজের বিভিন্ন কোন নীতি আছে যাতে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়া (এনএল ট্যাক্সোনোমি (জামির এন্ট আল, ২০১৮) খুঁজে পাচ্ছে যে দৃশ্য কাজের মধ্যে একটি কাঠামো রয়েছে, যেটি তাদের জন্য পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা নীত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা জ্ঞানভাবে অনুপ্রাণিত একটি ফ্রেম, কোগটাস্কোনমি, এনএলপি কাজের জন্য ট্যাক্সোনোমি শিখতে প্রস্তাব করি। এই ফ্রেমের মধ্যে কনফিনিটিভ প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিশ্লেষক (সিআরএ) এবং কনফিনিট-নিউরাল ম্যাপিং (সিএনএম)। The former employs Representational Similarity Analysis, which is commonly used in computational neuroscience to find a correlation between brain-activity measurement and computational modeling, to estimate task similarity with task-specific sentence representations.  এনএলপি মডেল থেকে নিউরেল প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রকল্পের মাধ্যমে কাজের সম্পর্ক সনাক্ত করতে শিখতে পারে (যেমন FMRI ভোক্সেল)। ১২ এনএলপি কাজের পরীক্ষা যেখানে বার্টি/টিনিবের্ট ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে শিক্ষা পরিবর্তনের মূল মডেল হিসেবে, তা দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত কোগটাক্সোনিমি শিক্ষা পরিবর্তন করতে পারে এবং বিশ্লেষণীয় হিয়ারার্কি প্রসেস (সাতি, ১৯৮৭) ব্যবহৃত কাজের প্রত আরো বিশ্লেষণ করে যে সিএনএম মডেল-অ্যাগনোস্টিক কাজের ক্যাক্সোনাম শিখতে সক্ষম।', 'et': 'Kas on olemas põhimõte, mille kohaselt suunatakse üleminekuõpet looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete vahel? Taksonoomia (Zamir et al., 2018) leiab, et visuaalsete ülesannete seas eksisteerib struktuur, mis on nende jaoks siirdeõppe aluseks. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kognitiivselt inspireeritud raamistiku CogTaskonomy, et õppida taksonoomia NLP ülesannete jaoks. Raamistik koosneb Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) ja Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). Esimene kasutab representatsioonilise sarnasuse analüüsi, mida tavaliselt kasutatakse arvutuslikus neuroteaduses, et leida seos ajuaktiivsuse mõõtmise ja arvutusliku modelleerimise vahel, et hinnata ülesannete sarnasust ülesandespetsiifiliste lauseesitustega. Viimane õpib tuvastama ülesannete suhteid, projiseerides närvirepresentatsioone NLP mudelitest kognitiivsetele signaalidele (st fMRI vokselid). Katsed 12 NLP ülesandega, kus BERT/TinyBERT kasutatakse siirdeõppe alusmudelitena, näitavad, et kavandatud CogTaxonomy suudab suunata siirdeõpet, saavutades tulemuslikkuse, mis on konkurentsivõimeline analüütilise hierarhia protsessiga (Saaty, 1987), mida kasutatakse visuaalses Taskonoomias (Zamir et al., 2018), kuid nõudmata ammendavat paarijärgset ülesannete ülekandmist $O(m^2)$. Analüüsid avastavad, et CNM on võimeline õppima mudeliga agnostilist ülesande taksonoomiat.', 'cs': 'Existuje princip řízení transferového učení napříč úkoly v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP)? Taxonomie (Zamir et al., 2018) zjišťuje, že mezi vizuálními úkoly existuje struktura, což je pro ně základní princip transferového učení. V tomto článku navrhujeme kognitivně inspirovaný rámec CogTaskonomy pro naučení se taxonomie pro NLP úlohy. Rámec se skládá z analýzy kognitivní reprezentace (CRA) a kognitivně-neurálního mapování (CNM). První využívá analýzu reprezentační podobnosti, která se běžně používá ve výpočetní neurovědě k nalezení korelace mezi měřením aktivity mozku a výpočetním modelováním, k odhadu podobnosti úkolů s reprezentací vět specifických pro úkoly. Ten se naučí detekovat vztahy úkolů projekcí neuronových reprezentací z NLP modelů na kognitivní signály (tj. fMRI voxely). Experimenty na 12 NLP úlohách, kde jsou BERT/TinyBERT používány jako základní modely transferového učení, ukazují, že navrhovaná CogTaxonomie je schopna řídit transferové učení a dosáhnout výkonu konkurenceschopného procesu analytické hierarchie (Saaty, 1987) používaného při vizuální Taskonomie (Zamir et al., 2018), ale bez vyžadování vyčerpávajícího párového přenosu úloh $O(m^2)$ . Analýzy dále zjišťují, že CNM je schopen učit se modelově agnostické taxonomie úloh.', 'fi': 'Onko olemassa periaate ohjata siirtooppimista luonnollisen kielen käsittelyn tehtävien välillä? Taksonomia (Zamir et al., 2018) toteaa, että visuaalisten tehtävien joukossa on rakenne, joka on niiden lähtökohtana siirtooppimisen taustalla. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kognitiivisesti inspiroitua viitekehystä, CogTaskonomy, jolla opitaan taksonomia NLP-tehtäviin. Kehikko koostuu kognitiivisesta representaatioanalyysistä (CRA) ja kognitiivis-hermokartoituksesta (CNM). Ensimmäisessä käytetään Representational Similarity Analysis -analyysiä, jota käytetään yleisesti laskennallisessa neurotieteessä aivojen aktiivisuuden mittaamisen ja laskennallisen mallintamisen välisen korrelaation löytämiseen, tehtävien samankaltaisuuden arvioimiseen tehtäväkohtaisten lauseiden esittämiseen. Jälkimmäinen oppii havaitsemaan tehtäväsuhteita projisoimalla neurorepresentaatioita NLP-malleista kognitiivisiin signaaleihin (fMRI-vokseleihin). 12 NLP-tehtävän kokeet, joissa BERT/TinyBERT ovat siirtooppimisen perusmallina, osoittavat, että ehdotettu kogTaxonomia pystyy ohjaamaan siirtooppimista ja saavuttamaan suorituskyvyn kilpailukykyisenä visuaalisessa Taskonomiassa käytettävälle analyyttiselle hierarkian prosessille (Saaty, 1987) (Zamir et al., 2018) mutta ilman tyhjentävää parittaista $O(m^2)$ tehtävien siirtoa. Analyysit osoittavat myös, että CNM kykenee oppimaan malliagnostista tehtävätaksonomiaa.', 'ca': "Hi ha un principi per guiar la transfer ència d'aprenentatge a través de tasques en el processament natural de llenguatges? La taxonomia (Zamir et al., 2018) troba que existeix una estructura entre les tasques visuals, com un principi subjacent a l'aprenentatge de transfer ència per a elles. En aquest paper, proposem un marc inspirat cognitivament, CogTaskonomy, per aprendre taxonomia per a les tasques del NLP. L'estructura consisteix en Anàlisi de Representació Cognitiva (CRA) i Mapping Cognitive-Neural (CNM). La primera utilitza l'Anàlisi de la Similaritat Representacional, que es utilitza normalment en neurociència computacional per trobar una correlació entre la mesura de l'activitat cerebral i la modelació computacional, per estimar la similitud de la tasca amb representacions de frases específices de la tasca. Els últims aprenen a detectar relacions de tasca projectant representacions neuronals de models NLP a senyals cognitius (i.e., voxels fMRI). Els experiments en 12 tasques de NLP, on BERT/TinyBERT es fan servir com els models subjacents d'aprenentatge de transfer ència, demostren que la CogTaxonomy proposada és capaç de guiar l'aprenentatge de transferència, aconseguint un rendiment competitiu al Proces Hierarquic Analytic (Saaty, 1987) utilitzat en Taskonomy visual (Zamir et al., 2018) però sense requerir una transferència exhaustiva de $O(m^2)$ per parell. Anàlisis descobrin que el CNM és capaç d'aprendre taxonomia de tasques model-agnòstics.", 'bs': 'Postoji li princip da vodi učenje prevođenja preko zadataka u procesu prirodnog jezika (NLP)? Taksonomija (Zamir et al., 2018) smatra da struktura postoji među vizualnim zadacima, kao princip pod učenjem transfer a za njih. U ovom papiru predlažemo kognitivno inspirisani okvir, CogTaskonomy, da naučimo taksonomiju za zadatak NLP-a. Okvir se sastoji od analitika kognitivnog predstavljanja (CRA) i kognitivnog neuronskog mapiranja (CNM). Bivša zapošljava analizu predstavne sličnosti, koja se uobičajeno koristi u računalnoj neuronauci kako bi pronašla korelaciju između mjerenja mozga-aktivnosti i računalnog modela, kako bi procenila sličnost zadataka sa predstavljanjem kazne specifičnih zadataka. Posljednji se uči otkriti zadaćne odnose projekcijom neuralnih predstavljanja iz modela NLP-a na kognitivne signale (tj. fMRI vokse). Eksperimenti o 12 zadataka NLP-a, gdje se BERT/TinyBERT koristi kao temeljni modeli za učenje prijenosa, pokazuju da je predložena CogTaxonomija u mogućnosti voditi učenje prijenosa, ostvariti konkurentnost učinka na analitički hijerarhijski proces (Saaty, 1987) koji se koristi u vizuelnoj Taskonomiji (Zamir et al., 2018) ali bez zahtjeva da prebaci izvršne pare $ O(m^2)$ zadataka. Analizira dalje otkriće da je CNM sposoban učiti taksonomiju modela agnostičkih zadataka.', 'jv': 'Ana bener yang dipunanggé kanggo nggawe mulai nggawe layang-tanggal kanggo ngilangno ingkang saé (NLP) ? Tax-Tax (Namir et al, 2013) sumulasi nganggo sistem sing dumadhing kapan dadi wis anyar, nganggo siji supensi podho dipulangan para dhéwé. Nang pepul iki, kita mudhaya akèh basa luwih apik, Cogtask nomey, kanggo ngilanggar staksi kanggo nggawe barang NLP. Pametuné sumusung karo Cogn ative representation Anaytika (CIA) lan CoGNative-Neral Mapping (DNM). Laptop" and "Desktop Laptop" and "Desktop 480D Ndelengkat wih-wih luwih mbukaké karo KNM iso iso nggambar tarjamahan model-ageostik.', 'sk': 'Ali obstaja načelo za usmerjanje prenosnega učenja med nalogami obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP)? Taksonomija (Zamir et al., 2018) ugotavlja, da med vizualnimi nalogami obstaja struktura, kot načelo, ki temelji na transfernem učenju zanje. V prispevku predlagamo kognitivno navdihnjen okvir, CogTaskonomy, za učenje taksonomije za naloge NLP. Okvir je sestavljen iz analitike kognitivne reprezentacije (CRA) in kognitivno-nevralnega kartiranja (CNM). Prva uporablja reprezentacijsko analizo podobnosti, ki se pogosto uporablja v računalniški nevroznanosti za iskanje korelacije med merjenjem možganske aktivnosti in računalniškim modeliranjem, za oceno podobnosti nalog s predstavitvami stavkov, specifičnimi za nalogo. Slednji se nauči zaznati razmerje med nalogami tako, da projicira nevronske reprezentacije iz modelov NLP na kognitivne signale (tj. voksele fMRI). Eksperimenti na 12 nalogah NLP, kjer se BERT/TinyBERT uporabljajo kot osnovni modeli transfernega učenja, dokazujejo, da je predlagana CogTaxonomy sposobna usmerjati transferno učenje in doseči konkurenčnost analitičnega hierarhijskega procesa (Saaty, 1987), ki se uporablja v vizualni Taskonomiji (Zamir et al., 2018), vendar ne da bi zahtevali izčrpnega prenosa opravil po parih $O(m^2)$. Analize nadalje ugotavljajo, da je CNM sposoben učiti model-agnostično taksonomijo nalog.', 'ha': "Shin, akwai wani kanuni ya shiryar da shirin ayuka da aka shige sanar da su kowace aiki a cikin shirin jarraba harshe na asimi (NLP???) Taksonom (Zamir et al., 2018) ya gane cewa wani gida mai jira a cikin taskõkin idãnu, kamar wani misali wanda ke karya a danne da za'a sanar da su. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani firam da aka yi wahayi na kogTaskonomy, dõmin ya sanar taxnomi wa aikin NLP. Firam na ƙunsa da Cognitive Reposition Analytique (CRA) da Cognitive-Neural Map (CNM). Analyya na farko, wanda ake amfani da shi a cikin littãfin neuro na lissafa dõmin ya sãmu a haɗa tsakanin haske-aikin miyar da shirin lissafi, dõmin ya ƙaddara wani aiki da ke daidaita da gafalan-ƙayyade. Ga ta ƙara ya sanar da su gano masu haɗi ga aikin da za'a nuna masu motsi na neural daga motel na NLP zuwa misalin kognitive (misali, voxels na fMR). Experiments on 12 NLP tasks, where BERT/TinyBERT is used as the underlying motel for transfer learning, to show that the Recoyyanced CogTaksnomy is able to shiryar da transfer learning, achieve performance competitive to the Analytic Hierrchy Progress (Saraty, 1987) used in the vision Taskonomy (ZaMi et al, 2018) but not requesting tiresome and tiresome $O(m^2)$ transfer job. Ana ƙari ya gane cewa CNM yana iya iya iya karanta taxnomin aikin motsi-agnostic.", 'he': 'האם יש עקרון כדי להדריך את ההעברה ללימודים בין משימות בעבודת שפת טבעית (NLP)? טקסונומי (Zamir et al., 2018) מוצאת שמבנה קיים בין משימות ויזואליות, כעקרון על ידי לימוד העברה עבורם. In this paper, we propose a cognitively inspired framework, CogTaskonomy, to learn taxonomy for NLP tasks.  המסגרת מורכבת מאנליטיקת מייצגה קוניטיבית (CRA) ומפה נוירולית קוניטיבית (CNM). הקודם משתמש באנליזה דומה מייצגתית, אשר משתמש בדרך כלל במדע נוירו מחשבי כדי למצוא קשר בין מדידות פעילות מוח ודוגמה מחשבית, כדי להעריך דומות משימה עם מייצגות משפטים מסויימים למשימה. האחרון לומד לגלות יחסי משימה על ידי פרוייקציה מייצגים עצביים ממודלים NLP לאותות קוגניטיביות (כלומר, ווקסלים fMRI). ניסויים על 12 משימות NLP, שבו BERT/TinyBERT משתמשים כדוגמנים בסיסיים ללמוד העברה, מראים שהCogTaxonomy המוצעת מסוגלת להדריך את הלימוד העברה, להשיג ביצועים תחרותיים לתהליך הייררכיה אנליטית (Saaty, 1987) משתמשים בטאסקונומיה ויזואלית (Zamir et al., 2018) אבל מבלי לדרוש מעברת משימות של $O(m^2)$ זוג מיושבת. ניתוח נוסף לגלות כי CNM מסוגל ללמוד מודל-אגנוסטי משימה טקסונומיה.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན་ཡུལ་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་གནས་སྟངས་ཞིག་དགོས་སམ། ཊ་ཀོ་ནོ་མི་རྣམས་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འཆར་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། དེ་ཚོ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པའི་སྐོར་ལས་ཀྱང་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་རེད། CogTaskonomy, The framework consists of Cognitive Representation Analytics (CRA) and Cognitive-Neural Mapping (CNM). གཟུགས་པ་དེ་ནི་རྩ་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གཟུགས་ཅན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྗེས་མའི་མ་ཟད་དེ་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྣེ་རྟོགས་པ་ལས་NLP མ་དབྱིབས་ཤེས་པའི་མིང་རྟགས་ལ་མཐུན་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། Experiments on 12 NLP tasks, where BERT/TinyBERT are used as the underlying models for transfer learning, demonstrate that the proposed CogTaxonomy is able to guide transfer learning, achieving performance competitive to the Analytic Hierarchy Process (Saaty, 1987) used in visual Taskonomy (Zamir et al., 2018) but without requiring exhaustive pairwise $O(m^2)$ task transferring. CNM་ནི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྦྲེལ་བའི་བྱ་རིམ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་ན།'}
{'en': '', 'es': 'RocBert: Bert chino robusto con preentrenamiento multimodal contrastivo', 'fr': 'RocBert\xa0: Bert chinois robuste avec préentraînement contrastif multimodal', 'ar': 'RoCBert: برت صيني قوي مع تدريب مسبق متعدد الوسائط', 'pt': 'RoCBert: Bert chinês robusto com pré-treinamento multimodal contrastante', 'ja': 'RoCBert ：マルチモーダルコントラストプレトレーニングを備えた堅牢なチャイニーズバート', 'zh': 'RoCBert:多模态比于鲁棒汉伯特', 'hi': 'RoCBert: मल्टीमॉडल कंट्रास्टिव प्रीट्रेनिंग के साथ मजबूत चीनी बर्ट', 'ru': 'RoCBert: надежный китайский Bert с мультимодальным контрастным предварительным обучением', 'ga': 'RoCBert: Bert Síneach Láidir le Réamhoiliúint Chodarsnach Ilmhódach', 'ka': 'RoCBert: პრობსტი ჩინეთი ბერტი მრავალური კონტრესტიგური პრერეინცია', 'hu': 'RoCBert: Robusztus kínai Bert multimodális kontrasztív előkészítéssel', 'el': 'Ισχυρό Κινέζικο Μπερτ με Πολυmodale Αντιστατική Προετοιμασία', 'lt': 'RoCBert: stiprus Kinijos karštas su daugiarūšio kontrastiniu priešmokslu', 'it': 'RoCBert: Robusto Bert cinese con Pretraining Contrasto Multimodale', 'kk': 'RoCBert: КөпModal Contrastive Pretraining көпшілікті қытайша Bert', 'mk': 'RoCBert: Силен кинески берт со мултимедално контрастивно преправање', 'ml': 'റോസിബെര്\u200dട്ട്: മള്\u200dമോഡോള്\u200d കോണ്\u200dട്രാസ്റ്റിവ് പ്രിട്രെനിവുമായി ചൈനീസ് ബെര്\u200dട്ട്', 'ms': 'RoCBert: Bert Cina yang kuat dengan Pretraining Kontras Bermodal', 'mt': 'RoCBert: Bert Ċiniż b’saħħtu bi Prestrazzjoni Kontrastiva Multimodali', 'mn': 'RoCBert: Хятад Берт, олон модуль эсрэг хүчирхийлэлтэй', 'no': 'RoCBert: Robust kinesisk Bert med multimodal kontrastiv regning', 'pl': 'RoCBert: Wytrzymały chiński Bert z multimodalnym kontrastywnym wstępnym treningiem', 'sr': 'RoCBert: jačan kineski Bert sa multimodalnim kontrastivnim pretrenjem', 'si': 'RoCBert: විශාල චීනි බර්ට්', 'so': 'RoCBert', 'ro': 'RoCBert: Bert chinezesc robust cu pretenții contrastive multimodale', 'sv': 'RoCBert: Robust kinesisk Bert med multimodal kontrastiv pretraining', 'ta': 'RoCBert: Robust Chinese Bert with Multimodal Contrastive Pretraining', 'ur': 'روسیبرٹ: مثالماڈال کنٹرسیٹ پررین کے ساتھ چینی برٹ مضبوط ہے', 'uz': 'RoCBert: Robust Chinese Bert with Multimodal Contrastive Pretraining', 'vi': 'RoCBS: Ngân hàng Trung Quốc rắn rỏi với nhiều phương tiện tương phản.', 'hr': 'RoCBert: snažni kineski Bert s multimodalnim kontrastivnim pretvaranjem', 'bg': 'Здрав китайски Бърт с мултимодално контрастивно претрениране', 'id': 'RoCBert: Bert Cina yang kuat dengan Multimodal Contrastive Pretraining', 'ko': 'Rocbert: 다중 모드 대비 사전 훈련을 갖춘 견고한 중국 Bert', 'da': 'RoCBert: Robust kinesisk Bert med multimodal kontrastiv pretraining', 'nl': 'RoCBert: Robuuste Chinese Bert met Multimodale Contrastive Voortraining', 'fa': 'روسیبرت: برت چینی استوار با تزریق متفاوتی متفاوت', 'sw': 'RoCBert: Uchina wa Bert akiwa na mafunzo ya utaratibu mkubwa', 'de': 'RoCBert: Robuster chinesischer Bert mit multimodalem kontrastivem Vortraining', 'af': 'RoCBert: Robust Sjinees Bert met Multimodale kontrastiewe Pretraining', 'tr': 'RoCBert:Çoklumodal kontrastlı Çinli Bert', 'hy': 'ՌոՉբերթ. Հիմնական չինական բերթ՝ բազմամոդալ հակադրական փորձով', 'sq': 'RoCBert: Bert kinez i fortë me pretendim kontrastiv multimodal', 'am': 'RoCBert: የቻይና ብሬት በMultimodal Contrastive Pretraining', 'az': 'RoCBert: Multimodal Contrastive Pretraining ilə möhkəm Çin Bert', 'bn': 'রোসিবার্ট: মাল্টিমোডাল কন্ট্রেসিটিভ প্রশিক্ষণের সাথে চীনের বার্ট রোবাস্ট', 'bs': 'RoCBert: snažni kineski Bert sa multimodalnim kontrastivnim preprekom', 'ca': 'RoCBert: Una barreta xinesa robusta amb simulació contrasta multimodal', 'cs': 'RoCBert: Robustní čínský Bert s multimodálním kontrastním předtréninkem', 'fi': 'RoCBert: Kestävä kiinalainen Bert multimodaalisella kontrastiivisella esikoulutuksella', 'et': 'RoCBert: Tugev Hiina Bert koos multimodaalse kontrastiivse eeltreeninguga', 'sk': 'RoCBert: Robustni kitajski Bert z multimodalnim kontrastnim predvajanjem', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'jv': 'RB:', 'bo': 'RoCBert:རྩ་བ་ཅན་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་Bert སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྣུམ་ཚོགས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་སྐབས་', 'he': "רוצ'ברט: ברט סיני חזק עם אימון נגד רבים"}
{'en': 'The social impact of natural language processing and its applications has received increasing attention. In this position paper, we focus on the problem of safety for end-to-end conversational AI. We survey the problem landscape therein, introducing a taxonomy of three observed phenomena: the Instigator, Yea-Sayer, and Impostor effects. We then empirically assess the extent to which current tools can measure these effects and current systems display them. We release these tools as part of a “first aid kit” (SafetyKit) to quickly assess apparent safety concerns. Our results show that, while current tools are able to provide an estimate of the relative safety of systems in various settings, they still have several shortcomings. We suggest several future directions and discuss ethical considerations.', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados em larga escala alcançaram resultados SOTA em tarefas de PNL. No entanto, eles se mostraram vulneráveis a ataques adversários, especialmente para linguagens logográficas como o chinês. Neste trabalho, propomos RoCBert: um Bert chinês pré-treinado que é robusto a várias formas de ataques adversários como perturbação de palavras, sinônimos, erros de digitação, etc. Ele é pré-treinado com o objetivo de aprendizado contrastivo que maximiza a consistência do rótulo sob diferentes exemplos adversários sintetizados. O modelo toma como entrada informações multimodais incluindo as características semânticas, fonéticas e visuais. Mostramos que todos esses recursos são\nimportante para a robustez do modelo, uma vez que o ataque pode ser realizado nas três formas. Em 5 tarefas NLU chinesas, o RoCBert supera linhas de base fortes em três algoritmos adversários de caixa preta sem sacrificar o desempenho em um conjunto de testes limpo. Ele também tem o melhor desempenho na tarefa de detecção de conteúdo tóxico sob ataques humanos.', 'ar': 'حققت نماذج اللغات سابقة التدريب على نطاق واسع نتائج SOTA في مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. ومع ذلك ، فقد ثبت أنها عرضة للهجمات العدائية خاصة بالنسبة للغات المنطوقة مثل الصينية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح RoCBert: وهو Bert صيني مُدرب مسبقًا يكون قويًا لأشكال مختلفة من الهجمات العدائية مثل اضطراب الكلمات ، والمرادفات ، والأخطاء المطبعية ، وما إلى ذلك. ويتم تحديده مسبقًا مع هدف التعلم التباين الذي يزيد من اتساق التسمية في ظل أمثلة عدائية مركبة مختلفة. يأخذ النموذج كمدخلات معلومات متعددة الوسائط بما في ذلك الميزات الدلالية والصوتية والمرئية. نظهر كل هذه الميزات\nمهم لقوة النموذج حيث يمكن تنفيذ الهجوم في جميع الأشكال الثلاثة. عبر 5 مهام NLU الصينية ، يتفوق RoCBert على خطوط الأساس القوية في ظل ثلاث خوارزميات معادية للصندوق الأسود دون التضحية بالأداء في مجموعة الاختبارات النظيفة. كما أنه يؤدي أيضًا أفضل أداء في مهمة الكشف عن المحتوى السام في ظل الهجمات التي من صنع الإنسان.', 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos preentrenados a gran escala han logrado resultados SOTA en tareas de PNL. Sin embargo, se ha demostrado que son vulnerables a ataques de confrontación, especialmente para idiomas logográficos como el chino. En este trabajo, proponemos RocBert: un Bert chino preentrenado que es robusto para varias formas de ataques adversarios como la perturbación de palabras, sinónimos, errores tipográficos, etc. Está preentrenado con el objetivo de aprendizaje contrastivo que maximiza la consistencia de la etiqueta bajo diferentes ejemplos contradictorios sintetizados. El modelo toma como entrada información multimodal que incluye las características semánticas, fonéticas y visuales. Mostramos que todas estas características son\nimportante para la robustez del modelo, ya que el ataque se puede realizar en las tres formas. En 5 tareas de NLU en China, RocBert supera las sólidas líneas de base con tres algoritmos adversarios de caja negra sin sacrificar el rendimiento en un conjunto de pruebas limpio. También tiene el mejor rendimiento en la tarea de detección de contenido tóxico en caso de ataques humanos.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques préentraînés à grande échelle ont obtenu des résultats SOTA sur les tâches de PNL. Cependant, ils se sont révélés vulnérables aux attaques contradictoires, en particulier pour les langues logographiques comme le chinois. Dans ce travail, nous proposons RocBert\xa0: un Bert chinois préformé qui est robuste à diverses formes d'attaques contradictoires telles que la perturbation de mots, les synonymes, les fautes de frappe, etc. Il est préentraîné avec l'objectif d'apprentissage contrastif qui maximise la cohérence des étiquettes sous différents exemples contradictoires synthétisés. Le modèle prend en entrée des informations multimodales, y compris les caractéristiques sémantiques, phonétiques et visuelles. Nous montrons que toutes ces fonctionnalités sont\nimportant pour la robustesse du modèle puisque l'attaque peut être réalisée sous les trois formes. Sur 5 tâches NLU chinoises, RocBert surpasse les lignes de base solides sous trois algorithmes contradictoires de boîte noire sans sacrifier les performances sur un ensemble de tests propre. Il est également le plus performant dans la tâche de détection de contenu toxique lors d'attaques d'origine humaine.", 'hi': 'बड़े पैमाने पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल ने एनएलपी कार्यों पर SOTA परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं। हालांकि, उन्हें विशेष रूप से चीनी जैसी लॉगोग्राफिक भाषाओं के लिए प्रतिकूल हमलों के लिए कमजोर दिखाया गया है। इस काम में, हम RoCBert का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: एक पूर्वप्रशिक्षित चीनी बर्ट जो शब्द की गड़बड़ी, पर्यायवाची, टाइपो, आदि जैसे प्रतिकूल हमलों के विभिन्न रूपों के लिए मजबूत है। यह contrastive सीखने के उद्देश्य जो विभिन्न संश्लेषित प्रतिकूल उदाहरणों के तहत लेबल स्थिरता को अधिकतम करता है के साथ pretrained है. मॉडल शब्दार्थ, ध्वन्यात्मक और दृश्य सुविधाओं सहित इनपुट मल्टीमॉडल जानकारी के रूप में लेता है। हम इन सभी सुविधाओं को दिखाते हैं\nमॉडल मजबूती के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है क्योंकि हमले को सभी तीन रूपों में किया जा सकता है। 5 चीनी एनएलयू कार्यों में, RoCBert स्वच्छ टेस्टसेट पर प्रदर्शन का त्याग किए बिना तीन ब्लैकबॉक्स प्रतिकूल एल्गोरिदम के तहत मजबूत बेसलाइन को मात देता है। यह मानव निर्मित हमलों के तहत विषाक्त सामग्री का पता लगाने के कार्य में भी सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'zh': '大预训言模NLP取SOTA于任。 然其效易对抗性攻,尤于中文之言。 于是RoCBert:豫练中文Bert,可以御对抗性,单词扰同义词拼写错误。 以比学为先,以对抗性示例为表一致性。 其模形将包语义,语音、视觉特征在内者多模态信息为输。 我们展示这些功能是\n对模型之鲁棒性重,攻可以尽三也。 5 中国 NLU 务,RoCBert 三黑匣子抗算优于强基线,而不洁试集之性。 在人为攻击下有毒成分检测,其形亦佳。', 'ja': '大規模な事前訓練された言語モデルは、NLPタスクでSOTAの結果を達成しました。 しかし、特に中国語のようなロジック言語では、敵対的な攻撃に対して脆弱であることが示されています。 この研究では、RoCBertを提案しています。RoCBertは、言葉の摂動、同義語、誤字などのさまざまな形式の対抗攻撃に強力な、事前に訓練された中国のBERTです。 これは、さまざまな合成された対立例の下でラベルの一貫性を最大化する対照的な学習目標で事前に訓練されています。 モデルは、セマンティック、音声、および視覚的特徴を含む入力マルチモーダル情報をとる。 これらの機能はすべて\n攻撃は3つの形態すべてで実行できるため、モデルの堅牢性にとって重要です。 中国の5つのNLUタスクで、RoCBertは3つのブラックボックス対抗アルゴリズムの下で強力なベースラインを上回り、クリーンテストセットのパフォーマンスを犠牲にすることはありません。 また、人為的な攻撃下での有毒物質検出タスクでも最高のパフォーマンスを発揮します。', 'ru': 'Масштабные предварительно обученные языковые модели достигли результатов SOTA по задачам NLP. Тем не менее, они были показаны уязвимыми для сопернических атак, особенно для логографических языков, таких как китайский. В этой работе мы предлагаем RoCBert: предварительно обученный китайский Bert, который устойчив к различным формам враждебных атак, таким как возмущение словом, синонимы, опечатки и т. д. Она предварительно обучена с целью контрастного обучения, которая максимизирует согласованность метки при различных синтезированных примерах соперничества. В качестве входной мультимодальной информации модель принимает семантические, фонетические и визуальные особенности. Мы показываем, что все эти функции\nважно для надежности модели, так как атака может быть выполнена во всех трех формах. В 5 китайских задачах NLU RoCBert превосходит сильные базовые линии по трем соперническим алгоритмам «черного ящика», не жертвуя производительностью на чистом тестовом наборе. Он также лучше всего справляется с задачей обнаружения токсичного содержимого при антропогенных атаках.', 'ga': "Tá torthaí SOTA bainte amach ag samhlacha teanga réamhoilte ar mhórscála ar thascanna NLP. Mar sin féin, léiríodh go bhfuil siad leochaileach d'ionsaithe sáraíochta go háirithe do theangacha logagrafacha mar an tSínis. Sa saothar seo, molaimid RoCBert: Bert Síneach réamhoilte atá láidir d'ionsaithe sáraíochta éagsúla cosúil le corraíl focal, comhchiallaigh, clóscríobháin, etc. Glacann an tsamhail faisnéis ilmhódach ionchuir lena n-áirítear na gnéithe shéimeantacha, foghraíochta agus amhairc. Léiríonn muid go léir na gnéithe seo\ntábhachtach do stóinseacht an mhúnla toisc gur féidir an t-ionsaí a dhéanamh sna trí fhoirm ar fad. Thar 5 thasc NLU na Síne, sáraíonn RoCBert bonnlínte láidre faoi thrí algartam sáraíochta an bhosca dhubh gan an fheidhmíocht ar thacar tástála glan a íobairt. Feidhmíonn sé freisin an chuid is fearr sa tasc a bhrath ábhar tocsaineach faoi ionsaithe de dhéantús an duine.", 'el': 'Μεγάλης κλίμακας προσχεδιασμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα έχουν επιτύχει αποτελέσματα SOTA σε εργασίες NLP. Ωστόσο, έχουν αποδειχθεί ευάλωτοι σε αντιπαραθέσεις ειδικά για λογογραφικές γλώσσες όπως τα κινέζικα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα προκαθορισμένο κινεζικό Μπερτ που είναι ανθεκτικό σε διάφορες μορφές αντίπαλων επιθέσεων όπως διαταραχή λέξεων, συνώνυμα, τυπογραφικά λάθη κ.λπ. Είναι προκαθορισμένο με τον αντικρουστικό μαθησιακό στόχο που μεγιστοποιεί τη συνοχή της ετικέτας κάτω από διαφορετικά συνθετικά αντικρουόμενα παραδείγματα. Το μοντέλο λαμβάνει ως εισαγωγή πολυμορφικές πληροφορίες συμπεριλαμβανομένων των σημασιολογικών, φωνητικών και οπτικών χαρακτηριστικών. Δείχνουμε ότι όλα αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά είναι', 'hu': 'A nagyszabású előképzett nyelvi modellek SOTA eredményeket értek el az NLP feladatokban. Mindazonáltal sebezhetőnek bizonyultak az ellenséges támadásoknak, különösen a logográfiai nyelvek, mint például a kínai. Ebben a munkában a RoCBert-t javasoljuk: egy előképzett kínai Bert, amely erős a különböző ellenséges támadások különböző formáinak, mint például a szózavar, szinonimák, elírások stb. Előképzett a kontrasztos tanulási célkitűzéssel, amely maximalizálja a címke konzisztenciáját különböző szintetizált ellenséges példák alatt. A modell bemeneti multimodális információkat vesz, beleértve a szemantikai, fonetikai és vizuális jellemzőket. Megmutatjuk, hogy ezek a funkciók', 'ka': 'დიდი მაგალითი წავლის მოდელები NLP დავალების SOTA წარმოდგენა. მაგრამ, ისინი ჩვენებულიან განატებარიული ატაკებისთვის, განსაკუთრებით ლოგრაფიური ენებისთვის, როგორც ჩინეთი. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პროკბერტის წინასწორებულია: ჩინეთი ბერტი, რომელიც განსხვავებული ანტერბერტიული ატაკების სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადას მოდელის შესაბამისი მულტიმოდიალური ინფორმაცია, როგორც სენმანტიკური, ფონეტიკური და ვიზუალური ფუნქციები. ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ამ ყველა შესახებ', 'kk': 'Үлкен масштабы өзгертілген тіл үлгілері NLP тапсырмаларында SOTA нәтижесін жеткізді. Бірақ олар қарсы қарсы қалдыруды көрсетілді, осылай қатар, Қытай секілді логографикалық тілдер үшін. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз RoCBert дегенді таңдаймыз: белгілерді түрлі синтезациялық негізгі мәселелердің түрлі қарсылық қалдыруды, синонимдер, типолар және т. б. қарсылық үйрену мақсатымен бұл белгілерді түрлі синтезациялық қарсылық мысалдарының Бұл үлгі semantic, фонетикалық және визуалдық мүмкіндіктерді қоса бірнеше модель мәліметі ретінде береді. Бұл мүмкіндіктер', 'it': "Modelli linguistici pre-addestrati su larga scala hanno ottenuto risultati SOTA sulle attività NLP. Tuttavia, sono stati mostrati vulnerabili agli attacchi avversi soprattutto per le lingue logografiche come il cinese. In questo lavoro, proponiamo RoCBert: un Bert cinese pretrained che è robusto a varie forme di attacchi avversi come perturbazione delle parole, sinonimi, errori di battitura, ecc. È pretrained con l'obiettivo di apprendimento contrastante che massimizza la coerenza dell'etichetta sotto diversi esempi avversi sintetizzati. Il modello prende come input informazioni multimodali comprese le caratteristiche semantiche, fonetiche e visive. Mostriamo tutte queste caratteristiche sono", 'lt': 'Didelės apimties išankstinio mokymo kalbomis modeliai pasiekė SOTA rezultatus, susijusius su NLP užduotimis. Tačiau paaiškėjo, kad jos pažeidžiamos priešingoms išpuolėms, ypač tokioms logografinėms kalboms kaip kinų. Šiame darbe siūlome RoCBert: iš anksto apmokytas Kinijos karštas, kuris yra tvirtas įvairioms priešiškų išpuolių formoms, pvz., žodžio perturbacija, sinonimiai, tipai ir t. t. Jis yra apmokytas kontrastiniu mokymosi tikslu, kuris maksimaliai padidina etiketės nuoseklumą pagal skirtingus sintezuotus priešiškus pavyzdžius. Modelyje pateikiama daugiarūšio transporto informacija, įskaitant semantines, fonetines ir vizualines savybes. Mes rodome, kad visos šios savybės yra', 'ms': 'Model bahasa yang dilatih dahulu skala besar telah mencapai keputusan SOTA pada tugas NLP. Namun, mereka telah menunjukkan rentan terhadap serangan musuh terutama untuk bahasa logografik seperti Cina. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan RoCBert: Bert Cina yang dilatih dahulu yang kuat kepada berbagai bentuk serangan musuh seperti perturbasi perkataan, sinonim, tipos, dll. Ia dilatih dahulu dengan objektif pembelajaran bertentangan yang maksimumkan konsistensi label di bawah contoh musuh yang disintesis berbeza. Model mengambil sebagai input maklumat multimodal termasuk ciri-ciri semantik, fonetik dan visual. Kita tunjukkan semua ciri-ciri ini', 'mk': 'Large-scale pretrained language models have achieved SOTA results on NLP tasks.  Сепак, тие се покажаа ранливи на непријателски напади особено за лоографски јазици како кинески. Во оваа работа, предложуваме РоЦберт: претрениран кинески берт кој е силен за различни форми на противници напади како што се зборовите пертурбирање, синоними, типови итн. Претрениран е со контрастивната цел на учење што ја максимизира константноста на етикетата под различни синтетизирани противници примери. The model takes as input multimodal information including the semantic, phonetic and visual features.  Ги покажуваме сите овие карактеристики', 'ml': 'വലിയ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d NLP ജോലികളില്\u200d SOTA ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. However, they have been shown vulnerable to adversarial attacks especially for logographic languages like Chinese.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d റോസിബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ പ്രൊജന്\u200d ചൈനീസ് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം, സിനോണിമം, ടൈപ്പോസുകള്\u200d പോലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലെ ആക്രമണ ഈ മോഡല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക്, ഫോണെറ്റിക്കും കാഴ്ചക്കുമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളായി ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് പലിമോഡില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളായി എട നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഇതൊക്കെയാണ്.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл загварууд нь NLP даалгаварын SOTA үр дүнг олсон. Гэвч тэд Хятад шиг логографик хэлний хувьд эсэргүүцлийн дайралд эмзэг байдаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид RoCBert-г санал болгож байна: Хятад Берт гэдэг нь олон төрлийн эсэргүүцлийн дайралтууд гэх мэт өөр хэлбэртэй эсэргүүцлийн дайралтууд, хэлбэрүүд, типос, т.д. гэх мэт. Загвар нь олон загвар өгөгдсөн мэдээлэл, semantic, phonetic, visual features гэх мэт. Бид эдгээр бүх зүйлсийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Stor stor språk- modeller har oppnådd SOTA- resultat på NLP- oppgåver. Dei har imidlertid vist sårbare for adversarialnataka, spesielt for logografiske språk som kinesisk. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi RoCBert: ein trekkt kinesisk Bert som er sterkt til ulike formar av adversariske attackar som ord perturbasjon, synonym, typar osv. Det er trekkt med den kontrastiske læringsmålet som maksimerer merkelappen konsistens under ulike syntetiserte adversariske eksemplar. Modellen tar som inndata frå multimodal informasjon, inkludert semantiske, fonetiske og visuelle funksjonar. Vi viser alle desse funksjonane er', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite la scară largă au obținut rezultate SOTA în sarcinile PNL. Cu toate acestea, s-au dovedit vulnerabile la atacurile adversare, în special pentru limbile logografice precum chineza. În această lucrare, propunem RoCBert: un Bert chinez pre-instruit, robust la diferite forme de atacuri adversare cum ar fi perturbarea cuvintelor, sinonime, greșeli de scriere, etc. Este pre-instruit cu obiectivul de învățare contrastantă care maximizează consistența etichetei sub diferite exemple adversare sintetizate. Modelul ia ca intrare informații multimodale, inclusiv caracteristicile semantice, fonetice și vizuale. Vă arătăm că toate aceste caracteristici sunt', 'pl': 'Wielkoskalowe wstępnie trenowane modele językowe osiągnęły wyniki SOTA w zakresie zadań NLP. Wykazano jednak, że są one podatne na ataki przeciwne, zwłaszcza w przypadku języków logograficznych, takich jak chiński. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy RoCBert: wstępnie trenowany chiński Bert, który jest odporny na różne formy ataków przeciwników, takich jak zaburzenia słów, synonimy, literówki itp. Jest on wstępnie przeszkolony kontrastywnym celem uczenia się, który maksymalizuje spójność etykiety w różnych syntetyzowanych przykładach. Model przyjmuje jako wejście multimodalne informacje, w tym cechy semantyczne, fonetyczne i wizualne. Pokazujemy, że wszystkie te cechy są', 'so': 'Large-scale pretrained language models have achieved SOTA results on NLP tasks.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa looga muujiyey kuwa dhibaatada ka geesta ah, khaas ahaan luqadaha logografiga sida Shiino. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa RoCBert: Shiino Bert oo loo soo bandhigay sabab kala duduwan oo ka mid ah dagaallo cadaawayaasha ah, sida hadal turjumaanka, synonyamka, tusaale ahaan, waxaa laguugu soo bandhigayaa macluumaadka waxbarashada ka hor jeeda, kaas oo aad ugu sii kordhiya alaabta iswaafaqsan tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo cadaawayaasha ah. Tusaale ahaan waxaa loo qaadaa macluumaad kala duduwan oo ku qoran semantika, telefonetka iyo aragga. Waxan tusaynaa dhamaan waxyaabahan', 'sr': 'Veliki obrazovni jezički modeli su postigli SOTA rezultate na zadatke NLP-a. Međutim, pokazali su ih ranjivim na neprijateljske napade, posebno za logografske jezike kao što su kineski. U ovom poslu predlažemo RoCBert: predivni kineski Bert koji je jak na različite oblike neprijateljskih napada poput riječi perturbacije, sinonima, tipa itd. Prekršen je sa kontrastivnim ciljem učenja koji maksimalizuje konsekvenciju etikete pod različitim sintetiziranim neprijateljskim primjerima. Model uzima kao multimodalne informacije, uključujući semantičke, fonetičke i vizualne funkcije. Pokazujemo sve te karakteristike', 'sv': 'Storskaliga förkränade språkmodeller har uppnått SOTA-resultat på NLP-uppgifter. De har dock visat sig sårbara för motståndareliga attacker särskilt för logografiska språk som kinesiska. I detta arbete föreslår vi RoCBert: en förklädd kinesisk Bert som är robust för olika former av motståndareliga attacker som ordstörning, synonymer, skrivfel, etc. Den är förklädd med det kontrastiva lärmålet som maximerar etikettens konsistens under olika syntetiserade motståndareliga exempel. Modellen tar som inmatning multimodal information inklusive semantiska, fonetiska och visuella funktioner. Vi visar att alla dessa funktioner är', 'si': 'ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරපු භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් එක NLP වැඩේ SOTA ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබුනා. නමුත්, ඔවුන්ට චීනි වගේ ලොග්\u200dරාෆික් භාෂාවට විශේෂයෙන් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ වෙන්න මේ වැඩේ අපි RoCBert ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් චීනි බෙර්ට් එකක්, ඒක විශිෂ්ට විරෝධ විරෝධ වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් වර්ගයක් වගේ විරෝධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ,  මොඩල් එක්ක ඇතුළත් විශාල තොරතුරු විදියට ගන්නවා සෙමැන්ටික්, ෆෝනෙටික් සහ දර්ශන විශේෂිත අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සේරම අවශ්\u200dයය', 'ta': 'பெரிய அளவில் மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகள் NLP பணிகளில் SOTA முடிவுகள் பெற்றுள்ளது. ஆனால், அவர்கள் எதிரிகளான தாக்குகளுக்கு பிரச்சனையானவர்களாக காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளார்கள், குறிப்பாக சீன்ஸ் ப இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ரோசிபெர்ட் முன்நிரூபிக்கிறோம்: வார்த்தை மாற்றுதல், ஒத்திசைவு, வகைப்படுத்தல் போன்ற பல வகையான எதிர்காரணங்களுக்கு தொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. இது வித்தியாசமான கற்ற The model takes as input multimodal information including the semantic, phonetic and visual features. We show all these features are', 'ur': 'بہت بڑے مقدار کی زبان موڈل NLP کے کاموں پر SOTA نتیجے پہنچ گئے ہیں۔ لیکن ان کو شینیوں کی طرح لگوگرافی زبانوں کے لئے دکھایا گیا ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم روسیبرت کی پیشنهاد کریں گے: ایک پاکیزہ چینی برٹ جو مختلف طریقوں کے مخالف طریقوں پر مضبوط ہے لفظ، سینونیم، ٹیپوس، اور اگلے. یہ مخالف سیکھنے کے موضوع سے زیادہ مضبوط ہے جو مختلف مخالف مثالوں کے نیچے لیبل کی ملکیت کو بڑھاتا ہے. Model takes as input multimodal information including the semantic, phonetic and visual features. ہم ان سب فرصت کو دکھاتے ہیں', 'mt': 'Mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel fuq skala kbira kisbu riżultati SOTA dwar kompiti NLP. Madankollu, intwerew vulnerabbli għal attakki avversarji speċjalment għal lingwi logografiċi bħaċ-Ċiniż. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu RoCBert: Bert Ċiniż imħarreġ minn qabel li huwa robust għal diversi forom ta’ attakki avversarji bħal perturbazzjoni tal-kelma, sinonimi, tipos, eċċ. Huwa mħarreġ minn qabel bl-objettiv ta’ tagħlim kuntrastiv li jimmassimizza l-konsistenza tat-tikketta taħt eżempji avversarji sintetizzati differenti. Il-mudell jieħu bħala input informazzjoni multimodali inklużi l-karatteristiċi semantiċi, fonetiċi u viżivi. Aħna nuru li dawn il-karatteristiċi kollha huma', 'uz': "Name Lekin, ular Xitoycha kabi logografik tillari uchun diqqat harakatlarga qo'llangan ko'rinadi. Bu vazifanda, biz RoCBert tahlil qilamiz: ko'pchilik Xitoycha Bert (Xitoycha Bert) kabi qanchalik shakllarga o'tkaziladigan so'z turturbat, synonym, turlari va o'zgarishlar kabi qanday harakatlarga olib tashlanadi. Bu o'rganish maqsad bilan bir xitoylik tashkilotlarini ko'paytirish mumkin. Name Biz shu shaxsiyatlarni ko'rsamiz", 'vi': 'Cách mô hình ngôn ngữ trước mưa lớn đã đạt được kết quả SOTA trong việc lập trình NLP. Tuy nhiên, chúng đã được cho thấy yếu đuối trước những cuộc tấn công đối nghịch đặc biệt với ngôn ngữ logo như tiếng Trung. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi đề nghị Roebert: một người Trung Quốc bình thường được Bert mạnh đến các dạng tấn công khác nhau như biến chứng từ hoang, đồng xu, loại, v.v. Nó được so sánh với mục tiêu nghiên cứu tương phản nhằm nhằm tối đa hóa nhãn tương đối với các ví dụ tổng hợp khác nhau. Mô hình chứa các thông tin đa phương, gồm cả các tính năng ngữ pháp, ngữ âm và hình ảnh. Chúng tôi cho thấy tất cả những tính năng này', 'bg': 'Големите предварително обучени езикови модели са постигнали резултати по задачите на НЛП. Въпреки това, те са показани уязвими към противоречиви атаки, особено за логографски езици като китайския. В тази работа предлагаме предварително трениран китайски Бърт, който е здрав към различни форми на контрастиращи атаки като смущения на думи, синоними, печатни грешки и т.н. Моделът приема като входна мултимодална информация, включваща семантичните, фонетичните и визуалните характеристики. Показваме, че всички тези функции са', 'hr': 'Velika skala pretkišnih jezičkih modela postigli su SOTA rezultate na zadatke NLP-a. Međutim, pokazali su ih ranjivim protiv neprijateljskih napada, posebno za logografske jezike poput kineskih jezika. U ovom poslu predlažemo RoCBert: predivni kineski Bert koji je jak na različite oblike neprijateljskih napada poput riječi perturbacije, sinonima, tipa itd. Preklinjen je s objektivom kontrastivnog učenja koji maksimalizuje konsistenciju etikete pod različitim sinteziranim neprijateljskim primjerima. Model uzima kao multimodalne informacije uključujući semantičke, fonetičke i vizualne funkcije. Pokazujemo sve te karakteristike', 'nl': 'Grootschalige vooraf getrainde taalmodellen hebben SOTA resultaten behaald op NLP taken. Ze zijn echter kwetsbaar gebleken voor tegenstrijdige aanvallen, vooral voor logografische talen zoals Chinees. In dit werk stellen we RoCBert voor: een voorgetrainde Chinese Bert die robuust is tegen verschillende vormen van tegenstrijdige aanvallen zoals woordverstoring, synoniemen, typefouten, enz. Het is voorgetraind met het contrastieve leerdoel dat de labelconsistentie maximaliseert onder verschillende gesynthetiseerde tegenstrijdige voorbeelden. Het model neemt als input multimodale informatie met inbegrip van de semantische, fonetische en visuele kenmerken. We tonen al deze functies zijn', 'da': 'Storskalige prætrænede sprogmodeller har opnået SOTA resultater på NLP-opgaver. Men de er blevet vist sårbare over for modstridende angreb især for logografiske sprog som kinesisk. I dette arbejde foreslår vi RoCBert: en forudtrænet kinesisk Bert, der er robust over for forskellige former for adversarial angreb som ordforstyrrelse, synonymer, stavefejl osv. Den er forudtrænet med det kontrastive læringsmål, der maksimerer etikettens konsistens under forskellige syntetiserede adversarial eksempler. Modellen tager som input multimodal information, herunder semantiske, fonetiske og visuelle funktioner. Vi viser alle disse funktioner er', 'de': 'Große vortrainierte Sprachmodelle haben SOTA-Ergebnisse für NLP-Aufgaben erzielt. Sie sind jedoch anfällig für feindliche Angriffe, insbesondere für logographische Sprachen wie Chinesisch. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir RoCBert vor: ein vortrainierter chinesischer Bert, der widerstandsfähig gegen verschiedene Formen von feindlichen Angriffen wie Wortstörungen, Synonyme, Tippfehler usw. ist. Er wird mit dem kontrastiven Lernziel vortrainiert, das die Etikettenkostenz unter verschiedenen synthetisierten, feindlichen Beispielen maximiert. Das Modell verwendet als Eingabe multimodale Informationen einschließlich semantischer, phonetischer und visueller Merkmale. Wir zeigen alle diese Funktionen sind', 'id': 'Model bahasa yang dilatih sebesar skala besar telah mencapai hasil SOTA pada tugas NLP. Namun, mereka telah terlihat rentan terhadap serangan musuh khususnya untuk bahasa logografis seperti bahasa Cina. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan RoCBert: sebuah Bert Cina yang dilatih sebelumnya yang kuat untuk berbagai bentuk serangan musuh seperti perturbasi kata, sinonims, tipos, dll. dilatih sebelumnya dengan tujuan belajar kontras yang memaksimalkan konsistensi label di bawah contoh musuh yang disintesis berbeda. Model mengambil sebagai input informasi multimodal termasuk karakteristik semantis, fonetik dan visual. Kita menunjukkan semua ciri-ciri ini', 'ko': '대규모 사전 훈련 언어 모델은 이미 NLP 임무에서 SOTA 결과를 얻었다.그러나 그들은 특히 중국어와 같은 표지 언어에 적대적인 공격을 받기 쉽다는 사실이 증명되었다.이 작업에서 우리는 Rocbert: 각종 형식의 대항성 공격(예를 들어 단어 방해, 동의어, 맞춤법 오류 등)에 대해 노봉성을 가진 사전 훈련을 받은 중국어 Bert를 제시했다. 이것은 비교 학습 목표와 예비 훈련을 실시하여 서로 다른 종합적인 대항성 예시에서 라벨의 일치성을 최대한 높였다.이 모델은 다중모드 정보를 입력으로 하는데 의미, 음성과 시각적 특징을 포함한다.저희가 이 모든 특성을 보여드렸어요.', 'sw': 'Mfano mkubwa wa lugha ulioendelea umefanikiwa matokeo ya SOTA kwenye kazi za NLP. Hata hivyo, wameonekana kuwa na hatari ya mashambulizi yanayopinga hasa kwa lugha za kilogographic kama vile Kichina. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza RoCBert: Kichina Bert ambacho kinachapishwa na matukio mbalimbali ya mashambulizi ya upinzani kama vile maneno ya uvunjifu, usambazaji, aina nyingine, etc. Inasemekana na lengo la kujifunza ambalo linaongezea alama inayofanana na mifano tofauti ya upinzani. Mradi huo unachukua kama taarifa za watu wengi ikiwa ni pamoja na vipengele vya sekunde, simu na visheni. Tunaonyesha tabia hizi zote ni', 'fa': 'مدلهای زبانی بزرگ\u200cترین مقدار زیادی به نتیجه\u200cهای SOTA در کار NLP رسیده\u200cاند. به هر حال، آنها به حمله\u200cهای دشمنی آسیب\u200cآسیب نشان داده شده\u200cاند، مخصوصا برای زبانهای لوگوگرافی مانند چینی. در این کار، ما روسیبرت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: یک برت چینی که به شکل\u200cهای مختلف حمله\u200cهای دشمنی مانند کلمه\u200cهای تغییر، سینونیم، تیپوس و غیر از آن است. با هدف یادگیری متفاوتی تغییر تغییر داده می\u200cشود که با نمونه\u200cهای مختلف تغییر تغییر داده می\u200cشود که با نمونه\u200cهای مختلف ت مدل به عنوان اطلاعات چندین مدل وارد می\u200cشود که شامل ویژگی\u200cهای semantic, phonetic and visual است. ما تمام این ویژگی ها را نشان می دهیم', 'tr': "Ullakan öňünden önlenmiş dil nusgalary NLP işinde SOTA netijesini ýetdi. Ýöne olar Çinçe ýaly logografik diller üçin täsirli salyklara ýaraşykly görkezildi. Bu işde, biz RoCBert'a görkezilýän bir Bert diýip çalşyran çykyş güýçli sözlere, synonymlar, tipler we şeýle diýip kabul etýäris. Etiketleri beýleki syntetiséler ýaly nusgalaryň astynda süýtgeden öwrenme maksady bilen terjime edildi. Bu model semantik, fonetik ve görsel özellikleri dahil multimodal bilgi olarak alır. Bütin bu özellikleri", 'af': "Groot- skaal voorreine taal modele het SOTA resultate op NLP opdragte bereik. Maar hulle is gewys onvulneraal aan teëstandige atake, veral vir logografiese tale soos Sjinees. In hierdie werk stel ons RoCBert voorstel: 'n Pretrained Chinese Bert wat kragtig is na verskeie vorms van teëstandariewe atake soos woord perturbasie, sinonime, tipos, ensfh. Dit is voorstel met die kontrastiewe leer objek wat die etiket konsistensie maksimaliseer onder verskeie sintetiseerde teëstandariewe voorbeelde. Die model neem as invoer multimodale inligting insluitend die semantiese, fonetiese en visuele funksies. Ons wys al hierdie funksies is", 'sq': 'Modelet e mëdha të gjuhës së stërvitura kanë arritur rezultate SOTA në detyrat NLP. Megjithatë, ato janë treguar të prekshme ndaj sulmeve kundërshtare veçanërisht për gjuhët logografike si kinezët. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë RoCBert: një Bert kinez i parastërvitur që është i fortë ndaj formave të ndryshme të sulmeve kundërshtare si shqetësimi i fjalës, sinonimet, tipat, etj. Është i parastërvitur me objektivin e mësimit kontrastiv që maksimizon konsistencën e etiketës nën shembuj të ndryshëm të sintetizuar kundërshtar. Modeli merr si input informacion multimodal duke përfshirë karakteristikat semantike, fonetike dhe vizuale. Ne tregojmë që të gjitha këto karakteristika janë', 'am': 'Large-scale pretrained language models have achieved SOTA results on NLP tasks.  ነገር ግን የቻይና ብጤት ለሎographic ቋንቋዎች በተቃዋሚዎች ላይ መጋረጃዎች መሆኑን ታይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የቻይና ብሬት፣ በተለያዩ በተቃዋሚዎች ምሳሌዎች፣ ቃላት ማተማር፣ ዓይነቶች፣ እና በተለየ ትምህርት አካባቢ የተመሳሳይ፣ ተቃውሞ በተቃዋሚዎች ምሳሌዎች ላይ የተሰናከለ የቻይና ብሬት አፈላጊ ነው፡፡ ሞዴላው የsemantic, phonetic እና የራእይ ምርጫዎች ውስጥ የሚጨምር multimodal information እነዚህ ምርጫዎች ሁሉ', 'hy': 'Շատ մեծ լեզվի նախապատրաստված մոդելները հասել են SOta արդյունքներին ՆԼՊ-ի խնդիրների վրա: Սակայն դրանք խոցելի են ցույց տվել հակառակ հարձակումների դեպքում, հատկապես չինական լեզուների համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք Ռոքսիբերթ՝ մի նախավարժված չինական Բերթ, որը ուժեղ է հակառակյալ հարձակումների տարբեր տեսակների համար, ինչպիսիք են խռովություն բառերը, սինոնիմները, տիպոսները և այլն: Այն նախավարժված է հակառակյալ ուսումնասիրության նպատակով, որը մեծանում է պիտակի կո Մոդելը օգտագործում է բազմամոդալ տեղեկատվություն, ներառյալ սեմանտիկ, ֆոնտիկ և տեսողական հատկությունները: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս բոլոր հատկությունները', 'az': "Büyük ölçüdə önlənmiş dil modelləri NLP işlərində SOTA sonuçlarını başa düşdü. Halbuki onlar Çin kimi logografi dillər üçün düşmənçilik saldıqlarına zəif göstərildilər. Bu işdə, RoCBert'i təklif edirik: bir çeşitli Çincə Bert, bənzərinin perturbasyon, sinonim, typos və bənzərinin çeşitli təcavüzlərinə güclü olan, bənzərinin müxtəlif təcavüzlərinin müxtəlif məsəllərinin altında etiketi müəyyən edir. Model semantik, fonetik və görsel xüsusiyyətlər içərisində çoxlu modal məlumat kimi alır. Bütün bu xüsusiyyətlər", 'bs': 'Velika skala preklinjenih jezičkih modela postigli su SOTA rezultate na zadatke NLP-a. Međutim, pokazali su ih ranjivim na neprijateljske napade, posebno za logografske jezike poput Kineskog. U ovom poslu predlažemo RoCBert: predivni kineski Bert koji je jak na različite oblike neprijateljskih napada poput riječi perturbacije, sinonima, tipa itd. Preklinjen je sa objektivom kontrastivnog učenja koji maksimalizuje konsistenciju etikete pod različitim sintetiziranim neprijateljskim primjerima. Model uzima kao multimodalne informacije, uključujući semantičke, fonetičke i vizualne funkcije. Pokazujemo sve te karakteristike', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatges pré-entrenats a gran escala han aconseguit resultats SOTA en tasques NLP. No obstant això, s'ha demostrat vulnerables a atacs adversaris especialment en llengües logogràfics com el xinès. En aquest treball, proposem RoCBert: un Bert xinès pré-entrenat que és robust a diverses formes d'atacs adversaris com perturbació de paraules, sinonims, tipos, etc. Està pré-entrenat amb l'objectiu d'aprenentatge contrastiu que maximitza la consistencia de l'etiqueta sota diferents exemples adversaris sintetitzats. The model takes as input multimodal information including the semantic, phonetic and visual features.  Mostrem que totes aquestes característiques són", 'bn': 'এনএলপি কাজে ব্যাপক ভাষার মডেল এসওটার ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে। তবে বিরোধী আক্রমণের জন্য তাদের দেখা যাচ্ছে বিশেষ করে চীনের মত লোগোগ্রাফিক ভাষার জন্য। এই কাজে আমরা রোসিবার্টের প্রস্তাব করছি: একটি প্রেমিক চীনা বার্ট যা বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিরোধী আক্রমণের দিকে চুরি করা হয়েছে, যেমন শব্দ প্রতিযোগিতা, সিনোনিম, টাইপ, ইত্যাদি বিরোধী শিক্ষার উদ্দ এই মডেলটি মাল্টিমোডাল তথ্য হিসেবে গ্রহণ করে, যার মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক, ফোনেটিক এবং দৃশ্যমান বৈশিষ্ট্য। আমরা এই সব বৈশিষ্ট্য দেখাই', 'cs': 'Rozsáhlé předtrénované jazykové modely dosáhly SOTA výsledků na NLP úlohách. Byly však prokázány, že jsou zranitelné vůči nepřátelským útokům, zejména u logografických jazyků, jako je čínština. V této práci navrhujeme RoCBert: předtrénovaný čínský Bert, který je robustní vůči různým formám nepřátelských útoků, jako jsou narušení slov, synonyma, překlepy atd. Je předtrénován kontrastivním učebním cílem, který maximalizuje konzistenci etiket pod různými syntetizovanými příklady. Model bere jako vstup multimodální informace včetně sémantických, fonetických a vizuálních prvků. Ukážeme, že všechny tyto funkce jsou', 'fi': 'Laajamittaiset esikoulutetut kielimallit ovat saavuttaneet SOTA-tuloksia NLP-tehtävissä. Ne ovat kuitenkin osoittautuneet alttiiksi vastustajille erityisesti logografisille kielille, kuten kiina. Tässä työssä ehdotamme RoCBert: esiasennettu kiinalainen Bert, joka kestää erilaisia kontrastiivisia hyökkäyksiä, kuten sanahäiriöitä, synonyymejä, kirjoitusvirheitä jne. Se on esiasennettu kontrastiivisella oppimistavoitteella, joka maksimoi etiketin johdonmukaisuuden eri syntetisoitujen kontrastiivisten esimerkkien avulla. Malli ottaa syötteenä multimodaalista tietoa, mukaan lukien semanttiset, foneettiset ja visuaaliset ominaisuudet. Näytämme, että kaikki nämä ominaisuudet ovat', 'et': 'Laiaulatuslikud eelõpetatud keelemudelid on saavutanud SOTA tulemusi NLP ülesannetes. Siiski on nad osutunud haavatavaks vastaste rünnakute suhtes, eriti logograafiliste keelte puhul, nagu hiina keel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja RoCBert: eeltreenitud hiina Bert, mis on tugev erinevate vastaste rünnakute vormide suhtes nagu sõnade häired, sünonüümid, trükivead jne. See on eeltreenitud kontrastiivse õppe eesmärgiga, mis maksimeerib sildi järjepidevuse erinevate sünteesitud vastaste näidete puhul. Mudel võtab sisendina multimodaalset teavet, sealhulgas semantilisi, foneetilisi ja visuaalseid omadusi. Me näitame, et kõik need omadused on', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, an nuna su masu zarar da wajen attacki masu motsi, haske da harshen logografi kamar China. Daga wannan aikin, Munã bukãtar da RoCBert: a bakin da aka siffanta wa Kikiniya Bert wanda aka yi baka zuwa wasu formi na bakwai-bakin-bakwai kamar kalmar turturbatori, synonim, da misãlai, etc. An baka shi da goan da ke motsi da aka sanar da shi na motsi, wanda yana ƙaranci alama ta daidaita a a cikin misãlai masu motsi da suka haɗa. The model takes as input multimodal information including the semantic, phonetic and visual features.  Muna nũna dukkan waɗannan', 'sk': 'Obsežni predtrenirani jezikovni modeli so dosegli rezultate SOTA pri nalogah NLP. Vendar pa se je izkazalo, da so občutljivi na nasprotne napade, zlasti za logografske jezike, kot je kitajščina. V tem delu predlagamo RoCBert: predtreniran kitajski Bert, ki je robusten na različne oblike kontrastnih napadov, kot so motnje besed, sinonimi, tipkarske napake itd. Predtreniran je s kontrastnim učnim ciljem, ki povečuje doslednost etikete pod različnimi sintetiziranimi kontrastnimi primeri kontrastnega učenja. Model vzame kot vhodne multimodalne informacije, vključno s semantičnimi, fonetičnimi in vizualnimi značilnostmi. Prikazujemo vse te značilnosti.', 'he': 'דוגמניות שפות מראש במידה גדולה השיגו תוצאות SOTA על משימות NLP. עם זאת, הוראו שהם פגיעים לתקפות יריבות במיוחד לשפות לוגוגרפיות כמו סינית. In this work, we propose RoCBert: a pretrained Chinese Bert that is robust to various forms of adversarial attacks like word perturbation, synonyms, typos, etc. It is pretrained with the contrastive learning objective which maximizes the label consistency under different synthesized adversarial examples.  המודל לוקח כמידע רב-מודל כניסה כולל את התחומים הסמנטיים, הפונטיים ויזואליים. We show all these features are', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Nanging, wong-wong ki wis ngerasakno ora tau karo atak yan banget nggo langgar tarjamahan karo Caine. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita unêmêng ngombéh "Cokbêr" sing berarti winih ning karo "Burt" sing gak adhil karo akeh basa sing kalawartaké karo perturuné, sinanyom, Typos, lan uwis. Seneng karo akeh stir-stir langgar kuwi ak object contrastibé sing tau dadi nggawe gerakan akeh etiket sing berarti kudu podho akeh sing ngejaraké seneng pisar-convert. model Awak dhéwé ngerasakno kabèh lan kabèh iki', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་དག་གི་དབྱེ་བ་ཚོས་NLP ལས་འགུལ་ཐུབ་སྐྱེས་བ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་དང་འདྲ་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་གནོད་འགྲུལ་བ་ནི་གདོང In this work, we propose RoCBert: a pretrained Chinese Bert that is robust to various forms of adversarial attacks like word perturbation, synonyms, typos, etc. It is pretrained with the contrastive learning objective which maximizes the label consistency under different synthesized adversarial examples. The model takes as input multimodal information including the semantic, phonetic and visual features. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་དག་ཚང་མར་'}
{'en': 'The Paradox of the Compositionality of Natural Language A Neural Machine Translation Case Study', 'ar': 'الاستدلال متعدد الوسائط القائم على فرضية: الاستدلال الشرطي على القرائن النصية والمرئية المشتركة', 'es': 'Razonamiento multimodal basado en las instalaciones: inferencia condicional sobre pistas textuales y visuales conjuntas', 'fr': 'Raisonnement multimodal basé sur les locaux\xa0: inférence conditionnelle sur des indices textuels et visuels conjoints', 'pt': 'Raciocínio Multimodal Baseado em Premissas: Inferência Condicional em Pistas Textuais e Visuais Conjuntas', 'ja': 'オンプレミスベースのマルチモーダル推論：合同テキストとビジュアルの手がかりに関する条件付き推論', 'zh': '盖前提之多模态推理:合文本、视线之理推之', 'hi': 'आधार-आधारित मल्टीमॉडल रीजनिंग: संयुक्त पाठ्य और दृश्य सुराग पर सशर्त अनुमान', 'ru': 'Мультимодальное мышление на основе предпосылок: условный вывод о совместных текстовых и визуальных подсказках', 'ga': 'Réasúnaíocht Ilmhódúil atá Bunaithe ar Áitreabh: Tátal Coinníollach ar Chomhchliúnna Téacsúla agus Amhairc', 'ka': 'მულტიმოდიალური გამოსახულება: საერთო ტექსტუალური და ვიზუალური კულების შესახებ შესახებ', 'el': 'Πολυmodaler συλλογισμός με βάση τις εγκαταστάσεις: Συμπέρασμα υπό όρους για κοινά κείμενα και οπτικά στοιχεία', 'it': 'Ragionamento multimodale basato su premesse: inferenza condizionale su indizi testuali e visivi congiunti', 'hu': 'Előzetes alapú multimodális indokolás: feltételes fertőzés a közös szövegi és vizuális utakon', 'kk': 'Алдын- ала негізделген көптеген себептері: Жалпы мәтін және көрінетін клублардың шарттарының қасиеттері', 'lt': 'Daugiamodalis pagrindimas, pagrįstas patalpomis: sąlyginis pažeidimas jungtiniams tekstiniams ir vizualiniams požymiams', 'mk': 'Мултимодилно размислување базирано на премисот: условна инференција на заедничките текстуални и визуелни клучеви', 'ms': 'Pengesahan Multimodal Berasas-Premise: Pengesahan Bersyarat pada Petunjuk Tekstil dan Visual Berkongsi', 'ml': 'മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായിട്ടുള്ള മള്\u200dമൊഡോള്\u200d കാരണമാണ്: യൂണ്ട് ടെക്സ്റ്റുവലിനും കാഴ്ച ക്ലൂകളിലുമു', 'mt': 'Premise-based Multimodal Reasoning: Conditional Inference on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'no': 'Premisjonsbasert multimodal grunnlag: betydelig forskjell på samsvarte tekst- og visuelle klupper', 'mn': 'Дараагийн олон загварын шалтгаан: Нэгдсэн Текст болон Визуал Клуудын шалтгаан нөлөөлөлт', 'pl': 'Rozumowanie multimodalne oparte na premise: warunkowe wnioski na temat wspólnych tekstowych i wizualnych wskazówek', 'sr': 'Premise-bazirani multimodalni razlog: uvjetni utjecaj na zajedničke tekstualne i vizualne klupe', 'ro': 'Reacționarea multimodală bazată pe premisă: inferența condiționată asupra indiciilor textuale și vizuale comune', 'so': 'Sababta badan ee horay loo dhigay: Dhibaatooyinka muwaadinka ah ee Joint Textual and Visual Cloons', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරිමායිස් අධාරිත ගොඩමෝඩාල් හේතුව: සම්බන්ධ පැත්තක් සහ දර්ශණ ක්\u200dලූස් වල සාමාන්තික විශේෂ', 'ta': 'முன்னிருப்பு அடிப்படையில் பல காரணம்: Joint Textual and Visual Clouds on Conditional Inference on Joint Text and Visual Clouds', 'sv': 'Premisbaserad multimodal resonemang: Villkorlig inferens på gemensamma text- och visuella ledtrådar', 'ur': 'پرمیزی بنیادی Multimodal Reasoning: Conditional Inference on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'uz': 'Koʻrsatilgan Multimodal Reason: Joriy matn va Koʻrinadigan soatlar bilan foydalanish', 'vi': 'Đáp ứng đa phương tương ứng: Thông tin liên quan đến kết cấu hình và hình thức', 'nl': 'Multimodale redenering op basis van premise: voorwaardelijke conclusie over gezamenlijke tekstuele en visuele aanwijzingen', 'da': 'Premisbaseret multimodal begrundelse: betingelsesløshed på fælles tekst- og visuel ledetråd', 'hr': 'Premizirani multimodalni razlog: uvjetni utjecaj na zajedničke tekstualne i vizualne klupe', 'bg': 'Многомодално разсъждаване: условно заключение на ставните текстови и визуални знаци', 'id': 'Multimodal Reasoning berdasarkan Premise: Kondisional Inference on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'fa': 'واکنش\u200cهای متعددی بر پایه پیش\u200cفرض: تأثیر شرایط بر کلوپ\u200cهای متن و دیده\u200cای مشترک', 'ko': '전제에 기초한 다중모드적 추리: 텍스트와 시각적 단서에 기초한 조건적 추리', 'sw': 'Matokeo mengi yanayotumika: Kuingiliwa kwa hali ya kawaida kwenye Viwanja vya Kiteknolojia na Visual', 'de': 'Premise-based Multimodal Reasoning: Bedingte Schlussfolgerung auf gemeinsame textliche und visuelle Hinweise', 'af': 'Premiseer-gebaseerde Multimodale Reasoning: Bedinge Verwydering op Gesamelekte Teks en Visuele Klasse', 'tr': 'Birn채챌e modal seb채pli g철rn철힊ir: Birn채챌e Metin we G철rn철힊 kluplar barada 힊artla힊dyrma', 'sq': 'Reasoning Multimodal Based on Premise: Inference Conditional on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Premise-based Multimodal Reasoning: Conditional Inference on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'bn': 'প্রিয় ভিত্তিক মাল্টিমোডাল কারণ: যুক্ত টেক্সটুয়াল এবং দৃশ্যমান ক্লুয়ের বিরুদ্ধে প্রচণ্ড ইনফেরেশন', 'hy': 'Premise-based Multimodal Reasoning: Conditional Inference on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'bs': 'Premise-bazirani multimodalni razlog: Conditional Inference on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'cs': 'Multimodální odůvodnění založené na premise: podmíněný závěr na společné textové a vizuální stopy', 'fi': 'Tilapohjainen multimodaalinen päättely: ehdollinen päätelmä yhteisistä tekstillisistä ja visuaalisista vihjeistä', 'et': 'Ruumipõhine mitmeliigiline põhjendus: tingimuslik järeldus ühiste tekstiliste ja visuaalsete vihjete kohta', 'ca': 'Reasoning Multimodal Based on Premise: Conditional Inference on Joint Textual and Visual Clues', 'jv': 'Multimodal Raylan Ngawe preimise', 'sk': 'Multimodalni razlogi v prostorih: pogojna sklepanja o skupnih besedilnih in vizualnih sledih', 'he': 'הגיון multimodal מבוסס על המקום: הפרעה תנאי על רמזים טקסטוליים ויזואליים משותפים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྣམ་པ། མཐུན་ཡུལ་དང་མཐུན་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་པར།'}
{'en': 'Obtaining human like performance in NLP is often argued to require compositional generalisation Whether neural networks exhibit this ability is usually studied by training models on highly compositional synthetic data However compositionality in natural language is much more complex than the rigid arithmetic like version such data adheres to and artificial compositionality tests thus do not allow us to determine how neural models deal with more realistic forms of compositionality In this work we re instantiate three compositionality tests from the literature and reformulate them for neural machine translation NMT Our results highlight that i unfavourably models trained on more data are more compositional ii models are sometimes less compositional than expected but sometimes more exemplifying that different levels of compositionality are required and models are not always able to modulate between them correctly iii some of the non compositional behaviours are mistakes whereas others reflect the natural variation in data Apart from an empirical study our work is a call to action we should rethink the evaluation of compositionality in neural networks and develop benchmarks using real data to evaluate compositionality on natural language where composing meaning is not as straightforward as doing the math', 'ar': 'إنها ممارسة شائعة للأعمال الحديثة في التفكير المنطقي متعدد الوسائط للغة الرؤية لاعتماد صيغة تصنيف ثنائية أو متعددة الاختيارات تأخذ كمدخل مجموعة من صورة (صور) المصدر والاستعلام النصي. في هذا العمل ، نلقي نظرة رصينة على مثل هذه الصيغة `` غير المشروطة \'\' بمعنى أنه لا توجد معرفة مسبقة محددة فيما يتعلق بالصورة (الصور) المصدر. مستوحى من تصميمات كل من التفكير المنطقي البصري ومهام استدلال اللغة الطبيعية ، نقترح مهمة جديدة تسمى "الاستدلال متعدد الوسائط القائم على فرضية" (PMR) حيث يكون الافتراض النصي هو افتراض الخلفية على كل صورة مصدر.\nتحتوي مجموعة بيانات PMR على 15360 عينة مشروحة يدويًا تم إنشاؤها بواسطة عملية التعهيد الجماعي متعددة المراحل.\nمن خلال لقطات شاشة أفلام مختارة عالية الجودة وقوالب فرضية برعاية الإنسان من 6 فئات محددة مسبقًا ، نطلب من عمال المصادر الجماعية كتابة فرضية واحدة حقيقية وثلاثة عوامل تشتيت الانتباه (4 خيارات) بالنظر إلى الفرضية والصورة من خلال إجراء فحص شامل.', 'pt': 'É uma prática comum para trabalhos recentes em raciocínio multimodal de linguagem de visão adotar uma formulação de classificação binária ou de múltipla escolha tomando como entrada um conjunto de imagens de origem e consulta textual. Neste trabalho, damos uma olhada sóbria em tal formulação ``incondicional\'\' no sentido de que nenhum conhecimento prévio é especificado em relação à(s) imagem(ns) fonte(s). Inspirados pelos designs de raciocínio de senso comum visual e tarefas de inferência de linguagem natural, propomos uma nova tarefa denominada "Raciocínio multimodal baseado em premissas" (PMR), onde uma premissa textual é a suposição de fundo em cada imagem de origem.\nO conjunto de dados PMR contém 15.360 amostras anotadas manualmente que são criadas por um processo de crowdsourcing multifásico.\nCom capturas de tela selecionadas de filmes de alta qualidade e modelos de premissas com curadoria humana de 6 categorias predefinidas, pedimos aos trabalhadores de crowdsource que escrevam uma hipótese verdadeira e três distratores (4 opções) dada a premissa e a imagem por meio de um procedimento de verificação cruzada.', 'fr': "Il est courant pour les travaux récents de raisonnement intermodal en langage visuel d'adopter une formulation de classification binaire ou à choix multiples prenant comme entrée un ensemble d'images sources et de requêtes textuelles. Dans ce travail, nous examinons avec sobriété une telle formulation «\xa0inconditionnelle\xa0» dans le sens où aucune connaissance préalable n'est spécifiée en ce qui concerne l'image ou les images sources. Inspirés par les conceptions des tâches de raisonnement visuel et d'inférence en langage naturel, nous proposons une nouvelle tâche appelée «\xa0Raisonnement multimodal basé sur des locaux\xa0» (PMR) où une prémisse textuelle est la présomption d'arrière-plan sur chaque image source.\nL'ensemble de données PMR contient 15 360 échantillons annotés manuellement qui sont créés par un processus de crowdsourcing en plusieurs phases. \nAvec des captures d'écran de films de haute qualité et des modèles de prémisse sélectionnés par l'homme dans 6 catégories prédéfinies, nous demandons aux travailleurs du crowdsource d'écrire une hypothèse vraie et trois distracteurs (4 choix) en fonction de la prémisse et de l'image par le biais d'une procédure de vérification croisée.", 'es': 'Es una práctica común en trabajos recientes sobre el razonamiento intermodal del lenguaje visual adoptar una formulación de clasificación binaria o de opción múltiple que toma como entrada un conjunto de imágenes de origen y una consulta textual. En este trabajo, observamos con sobriedad una formulación tan ``incondicional» en el sentido de que no se especifica ningún conocimiento previo con respecto a la (s) imagen (s) fuente (s). Inspirados en los diseños de las tareas de razonamiento visual de sentido común e inferencia de lenguaje natural, proponemos una nueva tarea llamada «Razonamiento multimodal basado en las instalaciones» (PMR) donde una premisa textual es la presunción de fondo en cada imagen de origen.\nEl conjunto de datos de PMR contiene 15 360 muestras anotadas manualmente que se crean mediante un proceso de crowdsourcing multifásico. \nCon capturas de pantalla de películas de alta calidad seleccionadas y plantillas de premisas seleccionadas por humanos de 6 categorías predefinidas, pedimos a los trabajadores de colaboración colectiva que escriban una hipótesis verdadera y tres distractores (4 opciones) dadas la premisa y la imagen a través de un procedimiento de verificación cruzada.', 'ja': '視覚言語クロスモーダル推論における最近の研究では、ソースイメージとテキストクエリのセットを入力として、バイナリまたは多肢選択分類の定式化を採用することが一般的である。 この作業では、ソース画像に関して事前の知識が指定されていないという意味で、このような「無条件」の定式化を冷静に見ています。 視覚的共通推論と自然言語推論の両方のタスクのデザインからインスピレーションを得て、テキストの前提が各ソース画像の背景推定である「前提ベースのマルチモーダル推論」（ PMR ）と呼ばれる新しいタスクを提案します。\nPMRデータセットには、マルチフェーズクラウドソーシングプロセスによって作成された15,360の手動注釈付きサンプルが含まれています。 \n6つの事前定義されたカテゴリから選択された高品質の映画のスクリーンショットと人間が企画した前提テンプレートを使用して、私たちは、クロスチェック手順を通じて前提とイメージを考慮して、真の仮説を1つと邪魔者を3つ（ 4つの選択肢）書くようにクラウドソースワーカーに依頼します。', 'zh': '视觉语言跨模态推理者最新常用二元或多选分类公式,以一组源图像及文本询为输入。 于此之中,静视无条件之表,无图象之先验知也。 受视觉常识推理和自然语言推理的开悟,我们发出一项名为"基于前提的多模态推理"(PMR)的新任,其中文本前提是每个源图像的背景假设。\nPMR 据集包 15,360 手动注之样本,样本创于众包。 \n因6定义之高质量电影截图,与人工之规模板,请众包工作者以交检之,写真假设与三扰(4择)。', 'hi': 'यह दृष्टि भाषा में हाल के कार्यों के लिए एक आम अभ्यास है क्रॉस-मोडल तर्क एक द्विआधारी या बहु-विकल्प वर्गीकरण सूत्रीकरण को अपनाने के लिए स्रोत छवि (ओं) और पाठ्य क्वेरी के एक सेट को इनपुट के रूप में लेते हुए। इस काम में, हम इस तरह के एक \'बिना शर्त\' सूत्रीकरण पर इस अर्थ में एक शांत नज़र डालते हैं कि स्रोत छवि (ओं) के संबंध में कोई पूर्व ज्ञान निर्दिष्ट नहीं किया गया है। दृश्य कॉमनसेंस तर्क और प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान कार्यों दोनों के डिजाइनों से प्रेरित होकर, हम "आधार-आधारित मल्टी-मोडल रीजनिंग" (पीएमआर) नामक एक नए कार्य का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जहां एक शाब्दिक आधार प्रत्येक स्रोत छवि पर पृष्ठभूमि अनुमान है।\nपीएमआर डेटासेट में 15,360 मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए नमूने होते हैं जो एक बहु-चरण भीड़-सोर्सिंग प्रक्रिया द्वारा बनाए जाते हैं। \nचयनित उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले फिल्म स्क्रीनशॉट और 6 पूर्व-परिभाषित श्रेणियों से मानव-क्यूरेटेड आधार टेम्पलेट्स के साथ, हम भीड़-स्रोत श्रमिकों को एक सच्ची परिकल्पना और तीन विचलित (4 विकल्प) लिखने के लिए कहते हैं जो एक क्रॉस-चेक प्रक्रिया के माध्यम से आधार और छवि को देखते हैं।', 'ru': 'Общепринятой практикой для недавних работ в области межмодального мышления языка зрения является принятие бинарной или многовариантной формулировки классификации, использующей в качестве входных данных набор исходных изображений и текстовых запросов. В этой работе мы трезво взглянем на такую «безусловную» формулировку в том смысле, что никаких предварительных знаний в отношении исходного (ых) изображения(й) не указано. Вдохновленные проектами как визуального здравого смысла, так и задач вывода естественного языка, мы предлагаем новую задачу под названием «Мультимодальное мышление на основе предпосылок» (PMR), где текстовая предпосылка является предпосылкой фона на каждом исходном изображении.\nНабор данных PMR содержит 15 360 образцов с ручными аннотациями, которые создаются многофазным краудсорсинговым процессом. \nС помощью выбранных высококачественных скриншотов фильмов и шаблонов предпосылок из 6 предопределенных категорий, мы просим сотрудников краудсорсинга написать одну истинную гипотезу и три отвлекающих фактора (4 варианта), учитывая предпосылку и изображение с помощью процедуры перекрестной проверки.', 'ga': "Is gnáthchleachtas é do shaothair le déanaí sa réasúnaíocht trasmhódúil fístheanga glacadh le foirmiú aicmithe dénártha nó ilroghnacha agus sraith d’íomhá(í) foinseacha agus d’fhiosrúchán téacsúil mar ionchur. Sa saothar seo, féachaimid ar fhoirmliú ``neamhchoinníollach'' mar sin sa chiall nach sonraítear aon réamheolas maidir leis an mbuníomhá/na híomhánna foinse. Arna spreagadh ag dearadh na réasúnaíochta ciallmhar amhairc agus na dtascanna tátal teanga nádúrtha araon, molaimid tasc nua darb ainm “Réasúnaíocht Ilmhódúil atá bunaithe ar Áitreabh” (PMR) áit a bhfuil bunús téacsúil an toimhde chúlra ar gach foinse íomhá.\nTá 15,360 sampla anótáilte de láimh sa tacar sonraí PMR a chruthaítear trí phróiseas sluafhoinsithe ilchéime.\nLe screenshots scannáin ardcháilíochta roghnaithe agus teimpléid réadmhaoine daonna-choimeádta ó 6 chatagóir réamhshainithe, iarraimid ar oibrithe foinse slua-hipitéis fíor amháin agus trí seachrán (4 rogha) a scríobh mar gheall ar an mbonn agus an íomhá trí nós imeachta cros-seiceála.", 'el': 'Είναι μια κοινή πρακτική για πρόσφατα έργα στη διατομεακή συλλογιστική γλώσσας οράματος να υιοθετήσουν μια διατύπωση δυαδικής ή πολλαπλής επιλογής ταξινόμησης λαμβάνοντας ως εισαγωγή ένα σύνολο πηγών εικόνων και κειμένου ερωτήματος. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε με νηφάλια μια τέτοια "άνευ όρων" διατύπωση με την έννοια ότι δεν προσδιορίζεται καμία προηγούμενη γνώση όσον αφορά την αρχική εικόνα. Εμπνευσμένοι από τα σχέδια τόσο της οπτικής λογικής όσο και των εργασιών συμπερασμάτων φυσικής γλώσσας, προτείνουμε μια νέα εργασία που ονομάζεται "Πολυmodal Reasoning βασισμένη σε Premise" (όπου μια κειμενική προϋπόθεση είναι το τεκμήριο υποβάθρου σε κάθε εικόνα προέλευσης.', 'it': 'È una pratica comune per i lavori recenti nel ragionamento cross-modale del linguaggio visivo adottare una formulazione di classificazione binaria o multi-scelta prendendo come input un insieme di immagini sorgente e query testuali. In questo lavoro, diamo uno sguardo sobrio a una formulazione "incondizionata" nel senso che nessuna conoscenza preliminare è specificata rispetto all\'immagine sorgente. Ispirati dai disegni del ragionamento visivo commonsense e dei compiti di inferenza del linguaggio naturale, proponiamo un nuovo compito chiamato \'Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning\'\' (PMR) in cui una premessa testuale è la presunzione di sfondo su ogni immagine sorgente.', 'hu': 'A látónyelv keresztmodális érvelésének közelmúltbeli munkái esetében általános gyakorlat egy bináris vagy többválasztási osztályozási megfogalmazás elfogadása, amely bemenetként forráskép(ek) és szöveges lekérdezések készletét veszi figyelembe. Ebben a munkában józanul megvizsgáljuk a "feltétel nélküli" megfogalmazást abban az értelemben, hogy a forráskép(ek) tekintetében nincs előzetes ismeret. Mind a vizuális közérzeti érvelés, mind a természetes nyelvi következtetési feladatok kialakításából inspirálva egy új feladatot javasolunk, "Premise-based Multi-Modal Reacting" (PMR), melynek során minden forráskép háttérfeltétele egy szöveges előfeltétel.', 'kk': 'Бұл көрініс тілінде жаңа жұмыс істеу үшін бірнеше көпшілік не көпшілік таңдау үшін көпшілік кескіндер және мәтін сұраныс жиынын келтіру үшін бинарлық не көпшілік таңдау үші Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз бұл "шартсыз" формулациясын қарап көреміз. Алдыңғы білім көзінің(тер) кескіндеріне қарай келтірілмеген. Көрінетін көпшілік сезімдерді және табиғи тілдерді басқару тапсырмаларының дизайнтары бойынша жаңа тапсырманы "Premise-based Multi modal Reasoning" (PMR) деп аталады. Мәтін премиясы әрбір көпшілік суретінің аясының арқылы премюзиясы.', 'ka': "ეს საერთო პროგრამია, რომელიც ახლა ვიდეო ენის კრასმოდეალური პარამენტის შესაძლებლობად ბიბინერი ან მრავალური მონიშნული კლასიფიკაციის ფორმენტის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც შესაძლებელია მხო ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავხედავთ ასეთი `ბონდამეტური'' ფორმაციას, რომელიც წინასწორედ ცნობიერება არ განსაზღვრულია იმისთვის გამოსახულებაზე. ვიზუალური საზოგადოებო პარამენტის და საზოგადო ენერგიის ინფრენციის მოქმედებების განზომილებით, ჩვენ შევძლებთ ახალი რაოდენობა, რომელიც უფრო მოდიალური გამოსახულების განზომილება (PMR) სადაც ტექსტური პრემიზი არის ყველა ფ", 'ms': "Ia adalah praktek biasa untuk kerja-kerja baru-baru ini dalam bahasa penglihatan alasan melintasi modal untuk mengadopsi formulasi klasifikasi binari atau berbilang-pilihan yang mengambil sebagai input set imej sumber dan pertanyaan teks. Dalam kerja ini, kita melihat dengan bijak kepada bentuk ``tanpa syarat'' dalam berarti tiada pengetahuan sebelumnya dinyatakan terhadap imej sumber. DiInspirasikan oleh reka-reka kedua-dua pemikiran visual yang biasa dan tugas kesimpulan bahasa semulajadi, kami cadangkan tugas baru bernama 'Pemikiran Multi modal Berasas-Premise' (PMR) di mana premis teks adalah anggapan latar belakang pada setiap imej sumber.", 'lt': 'Naujausiems vizijos kalbos kūriniams taikoma įprasta praktika, kad būtų priimta dviejų ar kelių pasirinkimų klasifikavimo formuluotė, kuria kaip įvestis būtų naudojamas (-i) šaltinio (-ių) vaizdo (-ių) rinkinys ir tekstinis klausimas. In this work, we take a sober look at such an ``unconditional\'\' formulation in the sense that no prior knowledge is specified with respect to the source image(s).  Įkvėpti vizualinio bendro motyvavimo ir natūralios kalbos išvadų užduočių projektus, siūlome naują užduotį, vadinamą "prieglobsčiu grindžiamu daugiarūšiu motyvavimu" (PMR), kur tekstinė prielaida yra kiekvieno šaltinio atvaizdo foninė prielaida.', 'ml': "കാഴ്ചയില്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള ഭാഷ ക്രിസ്മോഡില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു സാധാരണ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവാകുന്നു. ഒരു ബൈനരി അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മറ്റു തിരഞ്ഞെടുക ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d 'അസാധാരണമില്ലാത്ത' ഫോര്\u200dമൂലേഷന്\u200d നാം കാണുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള അറിവ് സൂര്യചിത്രത്തിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d വ്യക്തമ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ അപകടത്തിന്റെയും ജോലികളുടെയും ഡിസൈനസിന്റെയും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ഒരു ജോലിയുടെ പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ സോര്\u200d", 'mt': 'It is a common practice for recent works in vision language cross-modal reasoning to adopt a binary or multi-choice classification formulation taking as input a set of source image(s) and textual query.  F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nħarsu b’mod ċar lejn din il-formulazzjoni “mingħajr kundizzjoni” fis-sens li l-ebda għarfien minn qabel ma huwa speċifikat fir-rigward tal-immaġni(jiet) tas-sors. Ispirati mid-disinji kemm tar-raġunament viżiv komuni kif ukoll tal-kompiti ta’ inferenza tal-lingwa naturali, qed nipproponu kompitu ġdid imsejjaħ “Raġunar Multimodali bbażat fuq il-bini” (PMR) fejn premessa testwali hija l-preżunzjoni tal-isfond fuq kull immaġni tas-sors.', 'mn': 'Энэ нь саяхан харагдаж буй хэл(с) болон textual query(с) болон хоёр сонголт хэлбэрийн томъёог ашиглах шинэ дасгал юм. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид эх үүсвэрийн зураг(с)-тай харьцуулахад өмнө нь ямар ч мэдлэг тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг ойлгосон. Дэлхийн ерөнхий ойлголт болон байгалийн хэл халдварын даалгаварын загваруудын төсөөлөлд бид "Премиз-based Multi modal Reasoning" (PMR) гэдэг шинэ даалгаварыг санал болгож байна.', 'no': 'Dette er ein vanleg praksis for nyleg arbeid i synleg språk med krysmodal rasjon for å ta inn ein binær eller fleire val klassifikasjonsformasjon som tar inn eit sett kjeldebilete( ar) og tekstspørjing. I denne arbeida ser vi ein s ærleg sjå på slik « ukonditiv » - formasjon i følelsen at ingen førre kunnskap er spesifisert med hensyn til kjeldebiletet(ane). Innstillingane av utforminga av både visuelle fellesskapsrettingar og naturspråk-infeksjonspråk, foreslår vi eit nytt oppgåve som kallar «Premise-basert Multi modal Reasoning» (PMR) der ein tekst-premise er bakgrunnsfarge for kvar kjeldebilete.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich pracach w języku wizji powszechną praktyką jest przyjęcie formuły klasyfikacji binarnej lub wielokrotnego wyboru, przyjmując jako wejście zestaw obrazów źródłowych i zapytania tekstowego. W niniejszej pracy spojrzymy na taką,,bezwarunkową\'\' formułę w tym sensie, że nie jest określona wcześniejsza wiedza w odniesieniu do obrazu źródłowego(-ów). Zainspirowani projektami zarówno wizualnego rozumowania zdrowego rozsądku, jak i zadań wnioskowania języka naturalnego, proponujemy nowe zadanie o nazwie "Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning" (PMR), w którym założeniem tekstowym jest domniemanie tła na każdym obrazie źródłowym.', 'mk': 'Тоа е заедничка практика за неодамнешните дела во визискиот јазик на кросмодално размислување да се усвои бинарна или мултиизборна формулација на класификација која зема како влог сет фотографии од извор и текстуални прашања. Во оваа работа, јасно ја гледаме ваквата „безусловна“ формулација во смисла дека претходното знаење не е специфицирано во врска со фотографијата од изворот. Инспирирани од дизајните на визуелното заедничко размислување и природната инференција на јазикот, предложуваме нова задача наречена „Мултимодално размислување со база на премис“ (ПМР), каде што текстуалната претпоставка е претпоставката за позадина на секоја фотографија од изворот.', 'sr': 'To je zajednička prakse za nedavne radove na jeziku vidljivog kroz modalnog razmatranja da usvoji binarnu ili multiizbornu formulaciju klasifikacije uzimajući kao ulogu set a izvornih slika i tekstualnog pitanja. U ovom poslu, potrezno pogledamo takvu formulaciju "bez uvjeta", u smislu da se nikada pre nije određeno znanje u vezi s a slikom izvora. Inspirirani dizajnima objekata vizuelnog razuma i prirodnog jezika infekcije, predlažemo novi zadatak pod nazivom "Premise-bazirani multimodalni razlog" (PMR), gde je tekstualna premija predstava pozadinske pretpostavke na svakom izvornom sliku.', 'sv': 'Det är en vanlig praxis för nya arbeten inom visionsspråk tvärmodalt resonemang att anta en binär eller flervalsklassificeringsformulering med en uppsättning källbilder och textfrågor som indata. I detta arbete tar vi en nykter titt på en sådan "ovillkorlig" formulering i den meningen att ingen tidigare kunskap specificeras med avseende på källbilden. Inspirerad av utformningen av både visuellt allmännyttiga resonemang och naturliga språkdeduktionsuppgifter, föreslår vi en ny uppgift kallad Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning (PMR) där en textpremis är bakgrunden presumtion för varje källbild.', 'si': "මේක අලුත් වැඩක් විදියට දැක්ක භාෂා විශාල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් බායිනාරි හෝ විශ මේ වැඩේ අපි හිතන්නේ ඒ වගේම `අවස්ථාවක්' සුද්ධියක් බලන්න, ඒ වගේම මුලින් දැනගන්නේ නැහැ කියලා. සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවය සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාවය සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් වලින් සිද්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අපි අළුත් වැඩක් සිද්ධා කරනවා 'ප්\u200dරිමිස්-අධ්\u200dයාත්මක Multi-Model Reason", 'ta': "It is a common practice for recent works in vision language cross-modal reasoning to adopt a binary or multi-choice classification formulation taking as input a set of source image(s) and textual query.  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் 'தீவில்லாத' வடிவமைப்பை பார்க்கலாம் மூலத்தின் பிம்பத்தைக் குறிப்பிட முன்னோர் அறிவு எதுவும் குறிப்பி பார்வை தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் வடிவமைப்பு காரணம் மற்றும் இயற்கையான மொழி பாதிப்பு பணிகளின் வடிவமைப்பு வழங்கப்பட்டது, ஒவ்வொரு மூல பிம்பத்தின் மீதும் பின்னணி யூகங்கள் என", 'ur': 'یہ ایک دوسری یا بہت سی انتخابات کلاسی فرمول کے مطابق سراسر تصویر اور متکسل کیوری کے سٹے کے مطابق اٹھانے کے لئے اخری کاروں کے لئے ایک عمدہ عمل ہے. اس کام میں ہم اس طرح ایک "بے وقوف" فرمول کو دیکھتے ہیں جس طرح پہلے کوئی علم سورج تصویر(وں) کے بارے میں مشخص نہیں ہوتا۔ ہم نے ایک نوی تابع پیش کریں جس کا نام "Premise-based Multi modal Reasoning" (PMR) ہے جہاں ایک ٹیکسٹل پریمیز ہر سورج تصویر پر پچھلی تصویر ہے.', 'ro': 'Este o practică comună pentru lucrările recente în raționamentul transmodal al limbajului vizual să adopte o formulă de clasificare binară sau multifuncțională luând ca intrare un set de imagini sursă (surse) și interogare textuală. În această lucrare, analizăm cu atenție o astfel de formulare "necondiționată", în sensul că nu se specifică nicio cunoaștere prealabilă cu privire la imaginea sursă. Inspirați atât de raționamentul vizual al bunului sens, cât și de sarcinile de inferență a limbajului natural, propunem o nouă sarcină denumită "Premise-based Multi-modal Reationing" (PMR), în care o premisă textuală este prezumția de fundal a fiecărei imagini sursă.', 'so': "Waa habka caadiga ah ee ugu dambeysa shaqada muuqashada, sababtoo ah in loo soo qaadayo kooras fasax labaad ama kala duduwan oo loo qorayo sawir rasmi ah iyo qoraal qoraal ah. Markaas waxan, waxaynu fiirinaynaa qoraal ka mid ah `a an qasab lahayn', taasoo ah sababta aan aqoonta hore lagu qorin sawirka asalka ah. Shaqooyinka aragtida iyo qasabka jirada afka dabiicadda ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shaqo cusub oo la magacaabay 'Soo saarista qaab badan' (PMR) meesha uu ku qoran qaabka sawir kasta oo rasmi ah.", 'uz': 'Yaqinda ko\'pchilik tillari orqali bir necha boshqaruv darajasining formatlarini qo\'yish uchun umumiy ishlaydi. Manba rasm( lar) va matn soʻrovi sifatida kiritish uchun bir necha tanlangan. Bu vazifanda biz shunday `muvaffaqiyatli\' formulasini ko\'rib turamiz, manba rasm( lar) bilan birinchi bilmagan imkoniyatlarni aniqlash mumkin. Koʻrinadigan kompaniston dizayning asosiy va tabiiy tilning vazifalari bilan imzolangan, biz "Prezidenting Multi-Model Reading" (PMR) degan yangi vazifani ilova qilamiz. Bu yerda matnning bir manba rasmning orqa fon hisoboti.', 'vi': 'Đối với các tác phẩm gần đây về ngôn ngữ ngoại giao của Tầm nhìn, đó là thông thường khi s ử dụng một mô tả phân loại nhị phân loại hay đa lựa chọn lấy một số ảnh gốc và các câu hỏi kết cấu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi quan s át tỉnh táo một mô tả\'vô điều kiện\'như là không có gì được xác định về ảnh gốc. Lấy cảm hứng từ các thiết kế của cả việc lý luận và luận ngữ tự nhiên, chúng tôi đề xuất một nhiệm vụ mới được gọi là "Lý lẽ đa phương tiện ưu tiên (PMR) nơi cơ bản là giả định nền cho mỗi ảnh gốc.', 'bg': 'Често срещана практика за последните работи в областта на интермодалното разсъждение на езика на зрението е да се приеме двоична или многоизборна класификационна формулировка, като се въвежда набор от изходни изображения и текстови запитвания. В тази работа разглеждаме трезво такава "безусловна" формулировка в смисъл, че не са посочени предварителни познания по отношение на изходното изображение. Вдъхновени от дизайна както на задачите за визуално разсъждаване, така и на задачите за извеждане на естествения език, ние предлагаме нова задача, наречена "Многомодално разсъждаване на базата на premise" (ПМР), където текстовата предпоставка е фоновата презумпция на всяко изображение.', 'nl': "Het is een gebruikelijke praktijk voor recente werken in visie taal cross-modal redeneren om een binaire of multi-choice classificatieformulering aan te nemen die als input een set bronbeeld(en) en tekstuele query's gebruikt. In dit werk kijken we nuchter naar een dergelijke ``onvoorwaardelijke'' formulering in de zin dat er geen voorkennis is gespecificeerd met betrekking tot het bronbeeld(en). Geïnspireerd door de ontwerpen van zowel visueel gezond verstand redeneren als natuurlijke taal inferentie taken, stellen we een nieuwe taak voor genaamd 'Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning' (PMR), waarbij een tekstueel uitgangspunt de achtergrond veronderstelling is op elke bronafbeelding.", 'hr': 'To je zajednička prakse za nedavne radove na jeziku vida prekovremenom razumijevanju usvojiti binarnu ili multiizbornu formulaciju klasifikacije uzimajući kao ulogu kompleta izvornih slika i tekstualnog pitanja. U ovom poslu, potrezno pogledamo takvu formulaciju "bez uvjeta", u smislu da se nikada prije nije određeno znanje u pogledu izvornog slika(a). Uhvaćeni dizajnima objekata vizuelnog razuma zajedničkog razuma i prirodnog jezika infekcije, predlažemo novi zadatak pod nazivom "Premise-bazirani multimodalni razlog" (PMR), gdje je tekstualna premija predstava pozadine na svakom izvornom sliku.', 'da': 'Det er en almindelig praksis for nylige værker inden for visionssprog tværmodal ræsonnement at vedtage en binær eller multi-choice klassificering formulering, der tager som input et sæt kildebillede(er) og tekstforespørgsel. I dette arbejde tager vi et nøje kig på en sådan "betingelsesløs" formulering i den forstand, at der ikke er specificeret nogen forudgående viden med hensyn til kildebilledet(erne). Inspireret af designet af både visuelle almindelige ræsonnementer og naturlige sprog inference opgaver, foreslår vi en ny opgave kaldet \'Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning\'\' (PMR), hvor en tekstpræmis er baggrundsformodningen på hvert kildebillede.', 'de': 'Es ist eine gängige Praxis für neuere Arbeiten im crossmodalen Denken der Vision Sprache, eine binäre oder Multi-Choice Klassifikationsformulation zu übernehmen, die eine Reihe von Quellbildern und Textabfragen als Eingabe verwendet. In dieser Arbeit werfen wir einen nüchternen Blick auf eine solche,,bedingungslose\'\' Formulierung in dem Sinne, dass keine Vorkenntnisse bezüglich des Quellbildes spezifiziert sind. Inspiriert von den Entwürfen sowohl visueller Vernunft als auch natürlicher Sprache-Inferenz-Aufgaben schlagen wir eine neue Aufgabe namens "Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning" (PMR) vor, bei der eine textuelle Prämisse die Hintergrundvermutung jedes Quellbildes ist.', 'id': "Ini adalah praktek umum untuk pekerjaan baru-baru ini dalam bahasa penglihatan alasan transmodal untuk mengadopsi formulasi klasifikasi binari atau multi-pilihan mengambil sebagai input set gambar sumber dan pertanyaan teks. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita melihat dengan bijaksana formulasi seperti ``tanpa syarat'' dalam arti bahwa tidak ada pengetahuan sebelumnya yang dinyatakan mengenai gambar sumber. Terinspirasi oleh desain dari kedua pemikiran visual yang umum dan tugas pemberian bahasa alam, kami mengusulkan tugas baru bernama 'Pemikiran Berdasarkan Multi modal Reasoning'' (PMR) di mana sebuah premis tekstual adalah presunsi latar belakang pada setiap gambar sumber.", 'fa': 'این یک تمرین معمولی برای کارهای اخیر در زبان دیدگی در دلیل متفاوتی است که یک فرمول فرمول فرمول\u200cهای دویینی یا متفاوتی انتخاب می\u200cکند و به عنوان یک مجموعه تصویر(ها) منبع و سوال متن وارد می\u200cشود. در این کار، ما به چنین فرمول بی شرط نگاه می کنیم که هیچ دانش قبلی در مورد تصویر منبع(ها) مشخص نشده است. توسط طراحی\u200cهای منطقی که در نظر می\u200cگیرند، و کارهای آلودگی زبان طبیعی، ما یک کار جدید را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نامیده می\u200cشود «دلیل\u200cهای چندین مدال پیش\u200cبینی» (PMR) جایی که یک نقطه\u200cی متن در هر تصویر منبع پیش\u200cبینی است.', 'sw': "Ni utaratibu wa kawaida wa hivi karibuni unaofanya kazi katika tafsiri ya lugha ya kuonyesha kwa sababu ya kuchukua utaratibu wa a in a mbili au uchaguzi wa kadhaa unachukua kama kitengo cha utafiti wa rasmi(s) na utafiti wa maandishi. In this work, we take a sober look at such an ``unconditional'' formulation in the sense that no prior knowledge is specified with respect to the source image(s).  Kuhamasishwa na ubunifu wa jumuiya zote zinazoelezea maana na maambukizi ya lugha za asili, tunapendekeza kazi mpya yenye jina la 'Matokeo ya Mitandao mengi' (PMR) ambapo mtazamo wa maandishi ni dhana ya nyuma juu ya picha ya kila chanzo cha chanzo.", 'tr': 'Ýakynda görnüş dilinde ýakyn modal sebäpli işlemler üçin bir baýnary ýä bir multi-s a ýlaw surat(lar) we tekstal soragy diýip kabul etmek üçin ullanýan täze bir praktika. Bu işde biz çeşme(ler) suratynda hiç hili öňki bilim(ler) bilen takyklanmaýandygyny düşünýän `şartsyz\'(ler) formasyna gaty bir seredip görýäris. Görnüş duýgularyň razylygynyň we tebigy dillerin azalma täzelikleriniň saýlamalarynyň tarapyndan täze bir täze täze täzelikleri "Öň bellenen köp-modal sebäpli" diýip çaplandyrylýarys. Bu ýerde metin alany her çeşme suratynyň arkaplan sanatynda.', 'sq': 'Është një praktikë e zakonshme për punët e fundit në gjuhën e vizionit arsyetimin transmodal për të miratuar një formulim klasifikimi binar apo multi-zgjedhjesh duke marrë si hyrje një s ërë imazhesh burimi dhe pyetje tekstuale. Në këtë punë, ne shohim një formim të tillë `pa kushte\'\' në kuptimin se asnjë njohuri e mëparshme nuk është specifikuar lidhur me imazhin(e) burimit. Inspiruar nga dizajnet e arsyetimit vizual të zakonshëm dhe detyrave të inferencës natyrore të gjuhës, ne propozojmë një detyrë të re të quajtur "arsyetimi multimodal me bazë në premizë" (PMR) ku një premizë tekstuale është supozimi i sfondit në çdo imazh burimi.', 'af': "Dit is 'n gemeenskaplike praksie vir onlangse werke in die gesigte taal kruismodaal redening om 'n binêre of multikeuse klasifikasie formasie te aanvaar wat a s invoer 'n stel van bron beeld( s) en tekstuule navraag te neem. In hierdie werk neem ons 'n sober kyk na sodanige 'onbepaalde' formasie in die sens dat geen voorheede kennis gespesifiseer word met betrekking na die bron beeld(s). Inspirasie deur die ontwerpe van beide visuele gemeenskaplike redering en natuurlike taal inferensie-taak, voorstel ons 'n nuwe taak wat genoem word 'Premise-gebaseerde Multi modal Reasoning' (PMR) waar 'n tektuele premise is die agtergrondvoorspoeding op elke bron beeld.", 'am': 'በአሁኑ ጊዜ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የክፍለ ሥርዓት ውስጥ የሚሠራ ትምህርት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ እንደዚህ ያለ ``ስህተት› መልዕክት እናየዋለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ውጤቶች እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ አካባቢ ስራዎችን በማሳየፍ አዲስ ስራ እናስገድዳለን፡፡', 'hy': "Այն ընդհանուր գործընթաց է վերջերս տեսողական լեզվի միջոցային մտածողության ոլորտում, որպեսզի ընդունենք երկարային կամ բազմաընտրական դասակարգման ձևաչափություն, որը որպես մուտք է գործում աղբյուրների պատկերներ և տեքստային հարցեր: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք սպիտակ նայում ենք այսպիսի «անպայմանափակ» բանաձևին այն իմաստով, որ նախորդ գիտելիքը չի նշանակում աղբյուրների նկարի վերաբերյալ: Inspired by the designs of both visual commonsense reasoning and natural language inference tasks, we propose a new task termed 'Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning'' (PMR) where a textual premise is the background presumption on each source image.", 'az': 'Bu, yeni görünüş dilində çox modal fikirləşmək üçün çoxlu seçimlər klasifikasyon formülünü daxil etmək üçün çoxlu tərzdə təhsil edir. Bu işdə, biz böyük "müəyyən" formülünü gözləyirik ki, əvvəlki bilgi mənbə(lər) surətinə görə belə bir şey belə təmizlənməz. Görünürlü müxtəlif fikirləşdirmə və təbiir dil a şağılığı işlərinin dizaynlarından təşkil edilmişdir. Biz hər mənbə suratının arxa planı təşkil edildiyi "Premise-based Multi modal Reasoning" (PMR) adlı yeni iş təşkil edirik.', 'bn': "সাম্প্রতিক ভাষার ক্ষেত্রে কাজ করার জন্য এটি একটি সাধারণ প্রযুক্তি যা একটি বাইনারি অথবা বহুবিচ্ছিন্ন বিভাগের বিনিময়ে কাজ করার কারণে একটি উৎসের ছবি এব এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা একটি সাবধানের দিকে তাকিয়ে থাকি এই ধরনের ‘অস্বীকৃতিহীন’ ফার্মুলেশনের দিকে যে উৎসের ছবি (সূত্রের) সম্পর্কে কোন আগ দৃশ্যমান কমন্সেন্সের কারণ এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার আক্রান্ত কাজের ডিজাইন অনুপ্রাণিত করেছে, আমরা একটি নতুন কাজ প্রস্তাব করছি 'প্রিয় ভিত্তিক মাল্টিমোডাল প্রতিক্রিয়া' (পি", 'ca': 'És una pràctica comú per a treballes recents en el raonament transmodal del llenguatge de visió adoptar una formulació de classificació binaria o multielecció que pren com entrada un conjunt d\'imatges de font i preguntes textuals. En aquesta feina, mirem amb sobrietat aquesta formulació "incondicional" en el sentit que no s\'especifica cap coneixement previ en relació a la imatge(s) de font. Inspirat pels dissenys de raonament visual comú i de tasques de inferència de llenguatges naturals, proposem una nova tasca anomenada "raonament multimodal basat en premises" (PMR), on una premisa textual és la presunció de fons de cada imatge d\'origen.', 'ko': "시각 언어의 크로스모드 추리의 최근 작업에서 원본 이미지와 텍스트 조회를 입력으로 하는 2치 또는 다중 선택 분류 공식을 사용한다.이 작업에서 우리는 이러한'무조건'공식, 즉 원본 이미지에 대한 선험 지식을 지정하지 않은 것을 냉정하게 보았다.시각 상식 추리와 자연 언어 추리 임무 디자인의 계발을 받아 우리는'전제를 바탕으로 하는 다중모드적 추리'(Premise based Multi-modal reasoning, PMR)라는 새로운 임무를 제시했는데 그 중에서 텍스트 전제는 모든 원본 이미지의 배경 가설이다.", 'cs': 'V nedávných pracích v oblasti crossmodálního uvažování vizního jazyka je běžnou praxí přijmout binární nebo multi-choice klasifikační formulaci, která jako vstup přijímá sadu zdrojových obrazů a textových dotazů. V této práci se střízlivě podíváme na takovou,,bezpodmínečnou\'\' formulaci v tom smyslu, že nejsou specifikovány žádné předchozí znalosti s ohledem na zdrojový obraz(y). Inspirováni návrhy jak vizuálního uvažování zdravého rozumu, tak úloh inference přirozeného jazyka, navrhujeme nový úkol nazvaný "Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning" (PMR), kde textový předpoklad je předpokladem pozadí každého zdrojového obrazu.', 'et': 'Hiljutiste visuaalse keele ja modaalse m천tlemise t철철de puhul on tavaline kasutusele v천tta binaarne v천i mitme valikuga klassifitseerimiss천nastus, v천ttes sisendina l채htepildi(te) ja tekstip채ringu kogum. K채esolevas t철철s vaatame kainelt sellist "tingimusteta" s천nastust selles m천ttes, et l채htepildi(te) kohta eelnevaid teadmisi ei ole t채psustatud. Inspireerituna nii visuaalse m천istuse kui ka looduskeele j채reldus체lesannete kujundusest, pakume v채lja uue 체lesande, mida nimetatakse eeldusp천hiseks multimodaalseks m천istmiseks (PMR), kus tekstieelduseks on iga l채htepildi taustaeeldus.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset visuaalisen monikielisen päättelyn teokset ovat yleisesti ottaen omaksuneet binääri- tai monivalintaisen luokittelun, jossa syötteenä on joukko lähdekuvia ja tekstikyselyjä. Tässä työssä tarkastelemme järkevästi tällaista "ehdotonta" formulaatiota siinä mielessä, että lähdekuvasta ei ole määritetty aikaisempaa tietoa. Sekä visuaalisen järkeilyn että luonnollisen kielen päättelytehtävien suunnittelun innoittamana ehdotamme uutta tehtävää nimeltä Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning (PMR), jossa tekstilähtönä on kunkin lähdekuvan taustaoletus.', 'bs': 'To je zajednička prakse za nedavne radove na jeziku vida prekovremenom razumijevanju da usvoji binarnu ili multiizbornu formulaciju klasifikacije uzimajući kao ulogu kompleta izvornih slika i tekstualnog pitanja. U ovom poslu, potrezno pogledamo takvu formulaciju "bez uvjeta", u smislu da se ne predstavlja nikakvo znanje u vezi s slikom izvora. Uhvaćeni dizajnima objekata vizuelnog razuma i prirodnog jezika infekcije, predlažemo novi zadatak pod nazivom "Premise-bazirani multimodalni razlog" (PMR) gdje je tekstualna premija predstava pozadine na svakom izvornom sliku.', 'jv': "It is a Common prakse for recent Works in Visual language Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita gadoh sing beraksi ning larang 'onkuntual'' ning ngerasahan seneng gak bilgi sing ora bisa diantesik gantiné gambar gambar(s). Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing dibenalke perusahaan anyar nggambar nggawe luwih-luwih lan ijolan, kéné supoyo nggawe task gak nggawe 'premis-basa Multi-modal ratiorationing'' (PMR) sing dibenalke kotak nggawe bener sembarang pencil", 'sk': "Pri novejših delih v vizijskem jeziku je običajna praksa sprejeti binarno ali večizbirno klasifikacijsko formulo, ki vključuje kot vhod nabor izvornih slik in besedilne poizvedbe. V tem delu trezno obravnavamo takšno ``brezpogojno'' formulacijo v smislu, da predhodno znanje o izvorni sliki ni določeno. Navdihnjeni z oblikovanjem tako vizualnega smiselnega razmišljanja kot opravil sklepanja naravnega jezika, predlagamo novo nalogo, imenovano 'Premise-based Multi-modal Reasoning' (PMR), kjer je besedilna predpostavka domneva ozadja na vsaki izvorni sliki.", 'ha': "Ki da amfani na ɗabi'a wa aikin aiki na farko a cikin fassarar-tsohon harshen na gane don ya ɗauki wani tsarin sigogi na biyu ko wasu-zaɓen masu amfani da shi idan an shigar da wani tsarin zane(s) da tambayin matsalan. Daga wannan aikin, muna dũba wani surar da aka ƙayyade wannan tsarin `wanda ba'a s ãɓa ba' da mantin da ba a ƙayyade wani ilmi ba a gabãni game da zane(s). An Inspire wani aikin da za'a yi amfani da su biyu na fassarar aiki na fassarar harshen na gane da bakwai, za'a buƙata wani aikin da aka yi amfani da 'Taurar da Shirin-Duke-Motsi' (Prime R) a inda wani matsayin na rubutu na rubutu ne zaɓen bango kan zanen duk zane na source.", 'bo': 'It is a common practice for recent works in vision language cross-modal reasoning to adopt a binary or multi-choice classification formulation taking a s input a set of source image(s) and textual query. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་པའི་ཚིག་ཁག་ཅིག་ལ་བལྟས་ནི། འུ་ཅག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏོང་གསར་བ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'זו מעשה נפוצה עבור עבודות לאחרונה בשפת החזון הגיון דרך מודל לאמץ צורה בינרית או מסווג בהרבה בחירות בעבודה הזאת, אנו מסתכלים בפוכח על מיצור כזה "ללא תנאי" במובן שאין ידע קודם מוגדר בנוגע לתמונה(ים) המקורית(ים). בהשראה על ידי עיצובים של ההיגיון המפורסם ויזואלי והמשימות של השפה הטבעית, אנו מציעים משימה חדשה שנקראת "ההיגיון המורבומודאלי המבוסס על המקום" (PMR) שבו הנקודה טקסטלית היא הניחוש הרקע על כל תמונה מקור.'}
{'en': 'LexGLUE A Benchmark Dataset for Legal Language Understanding in English', 'ar': 'شبكة استعلام المثيل المتوازي للتعرف على الكيان المحدد', 'fr': "Réseau de requête d'instance parallèle pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées", 'es': 'Red de consultas de instancias en paralelo para el reconocimiento de entidades', 'pt': 'Rede de consulta de instância paralela para reconhecimento de entidade nomeada', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識のためのパラレルインスタンスクエリネットワーク', 'zh': '以名实识者并行实例询网络', 'hi': 'नामित निकाय पहचान के लिए समानांतर आवृत्ति क्वेरी नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Сеть запросов параллельных экземпляров для распознавания именованных сущностей', 'ga': 'Líonra Ceisteanna Comhthreomhaire maidir le hAithint Aonán Ainmnithe', 'ka': 'პარალელი ინსტენსტის კითხვა ქსელი სახელი ინტენტიტის განახლებისთვის', 'el': 'Δίκτυο ερωτήματος παράλληλης παρουσίας για αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας', 'hu': 'Párhuzamos példány lekérdezési hálózat a nevezett entitások felismeréséhez', 'it': 'Rete di query di istanze parallele per il riconoscimento di entità con nome', 'lt': 'Paralelinės instancijos klausimų tinklas vardinio subjekto pripažinimui', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау үшін параллелі инстанс сұраныс желі', 'mk': 'Мережа за пребарување во паралелна инстанца за препознавање на именувани ентитети', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Pertanyaan Kejadian Paralel untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama', 'mt': 'Netwerk ta’ Talbiet ta’ Instanza Paralela għar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള പാരാളല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dസ്റ്റെന്\u200dസ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക്', 'mn': 'Named Entity Recognition-ын параллел Instance Query Network', 'no': 'Parallel instansspørjingsnarveg for gjenkjenning av namnet entitet', 'pl': 'Sieć zapytań równoległych instancji dla rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów', 'ro': 'Rețeaua de interogare a instanțelor paralele pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite', 'sr': 'Paralelna instancijska pitanja mreža za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Iskuulka baarlamaanka', 'sv': 'Nätverk för frågefrågor för parallellinstanser för identifiering av namngiven enhet', 'ta': 'இணைப்பு நிறுவுதல் கேள்வி வலைப்பின்னல்', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đồng hồ tìm kiếm mạng dò tìm các loài có tên', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Parallel Instance Query Network for Named Entity Recognition', 'bg': 'Мрежа за паралелни заявки за инстанции за разпознаване на имена на субекти', 'da': 'Parallel Instance Forespørgselsnetværk til anerkendelse af navngivet enhed', 'hr': 'Parallelna Instance Query Network za priznanje imenovanih entiteta', 'de': 'Parallel Instance Query Network for Named Entity Recognition', 'ko': '명명 실체 식별의 병렬 실례 조회 네트워크', 'sw': 'Query Network for Named Entity Recognition', 'id': 'Rangkaian Pertanyaan Instansi Paralel untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama', 'fa': 'شبکه سوال Instance Parallel برای شناسایی عنوان نامیده', 'sq': 'Rrjeti i kërkimeve në Instancë Paralele për njohjen e njësisë së emëruar', 'am': 'Query Network for Named Entity Recognition', 'hy': 'Հիմա անվանումների ճանաչելու զուգահեռ անգամ հարցերի ցանց', 'af': 'Parallele Instans Navraag Netwerk vir Genaamde Eenheidwerkening', 'az': 'Adlı Entity Recognition üçün Parallel Instance Query Network', 'bn': 'নামের এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতির জন্য প্যারালেল ইনস্ট্রেন্স অনুসন্ধান নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Parallelna Instance Query Network za prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta', 'ca': "Rede de preguntes a instancia parallela per a la reconeixement d'entitats anomenades", 'cs': 'Dotazová síť paralelních instancí pro rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit', 'et': 'Paralleelse eksemplari päringuvõrgustik nimetatud üksuste tuvastamiseks', 'tr': 'Adlanmış Bir Taýşary üçin Parallel Instans Soragy Aýry', 'fi': 'Rinnakkaiskyselyverkosto nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamista varten', 'jv': 'Sample Instance Network', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'רשת בקשת במקרה שוואה לזיהוי ישויות בשם', 'sk': 'Omrežje poizvedb vzporednih primerkov za prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov', 'bo': 'Named Entity Recognition for Parallel Instance Query Network'}
{'en': 'Laws and their interpretations legal arguments and agreements are typically expressed in writing leading to the production of vast corpora of legal text Their analysis which is at the center of legal practice becomes increasingly elaborate as these collections grow in size Natural language understanding NLU technologies can be a valuable tool to support legal practitioners in these endeavors Their usefulness however largely depends on whether current state of the art models can generalize across various tasks in the legal domain To answer this currently open question we introduce the Legal General Language Understanding Evaluation LexGLUE benchmark a collection of datasets for evaluating model performance across a diverse set of legal NLU tasks in a standardized way We also provide an evaluation and analysis of several generic and legal oriented models demonstrating that the latter consistently offer performance improvements across multiple tasks', 'fr': "La reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) est une tâche fondamentale dans le traitement du langage naturel. Des travaux récents traitent la reconnaissance d'entités nommées comme une tâche de compréhension en lecture, construisant manuellement des requêtes spécifiques à un type pour extraire des entités. Ce paradigme souffre de trois problèmes. Tout d'abord, les requêtes spécifiques au type ne peuvent extraire qu'un seul type d'entités par inférence, ce qui est inefficace. Ensuite, l'extraction pour différents types d'entités est isolée, ignorant les dépendances entre elles. Troisièmement, la construction de requêtes repose sur des connaissances externes et est difficile à appliquer à des scénarios réalistes avec des centaines de types d'entités. Pour y faire face, nous proposons un réseau de requête d'instance parallèle (PIQN), qui met en place des requêtes d'instance globales et apprises pour extraire les entités d'une phrase de manière parallèle. Chaque requête d'instance prédit une entité, et en alimentant toutes les requêtes d'instance simultanément, nous pouvons interroger toutes les entités en parallèle. Au lieu d'être construites à partir de connaissances externes, les requêtes d'instance peuvent apprendre leurs différentes sémantiques de requête pendant la formation. Pour la formation du modèle, nous traitons l'attribution d'étiquettes comme un problème d'affectation linéaire (LAP) un-à-plusieurs et affectons dynamiquement des entités Gold aux requêtes d'instance avec un coût d'affectation minimal. Des expériences sur des ensembles de données NER imbriqués et plats démontrent que la méthode que nous proposons surpasse les modèles de pointe précédents.", 'pt': 'O reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) é uma tarefa fundamental no processamento de linguagem natural. Trabalhos recentes tratam o reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas como uma tarefa de compreensão de leitura, construindo manualmente consultas tipo-específicas para extrair entidades. Este paradigma sofre de três questões. Primeiro, as consultas específicas de tipo podem extrair apenas um tipo de entidade por inferência, o que é ineficiente. Segundo, a extração para diferentes tipos de entidades é isolada, ignorando as dependências entre elas. Terceiro, a construção de consultas depende de conhecimento externo e é difícil de aplicar a cenários realistas com centenas de tipos de entidade. Para lidar com eles, propomos o Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), que configura consultas de instância globais e apreensíveis para extrair entidades de uma sentença de maneira paralela. Cada consulta de instância prevê uma entidade e, alimentando todas as consultas de instância simultaneamente, podemos consultar todas as entidades em paralelo. Em vez de serem construídas a partir de conhecimento externo, as consultas de instância podem aprender suas diferentes semânticas de consulta durante o treinamento. Para treinar o modelo, tratamos a atribuição de rótulos como um problema de atribuição linear de um para muitos (LAP) e atribuímos dinamicamente entidades gold a consultas de instância com custo mínimo de atribuição. Experimentos em conjuntos de dados NER aninhados e planos demonstram que nosso método proposto supera os modelos anteriores de última geração.', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）は、自然言語処理における基本的なタスクです。 最近の研究では、名前付きエンティティ認識を読み取り理解タスクとして扱い、タイプ固有のクエリを手動で構築してエンティティを抽出します。 このパラダイムは3つの問題に悩まされている。 まず、タイプ固有のクエリは、推論ごとに1種類のエンティティしか抽出できません。これは非効率です。 第二に、異なるタイプのエンティティの抽出は、それらのエンティティ間の依存関係を無視して隔離されます。 第三に、クエリ構築は外部知識に依存しており、数百のエンティティタイプを持つ現実的なシナリオに適用することは困難です。 それらに対処するために、パラレルインスタンスクエリネットワーク（ PIQN ）を提案します。これは、文からエンティティを並行して抽出するためのグローバルで学習可能なインスタンスクエリを設定します。 各インスタンスクエリは1つのエンティティを予測し、すべてのインスタンスクエリを同時にフィードすることで、すべてのエンティティを並行してクエリできます。 外部知識から構築されるのではなく、インスタンスクエリはトレーニング中に異なるクエリ意味論を学ぶことができます。 モデルのトレーニングでは、ラベル割り当てを1対多の線形割り当て問題（ LAP ）として扱い、割り当てコストを最小限に抑えてインスタンスクエリに金エンティティを動的に割り当てます。 ネストされたNERデータセットとフラットNERデータセットの両方での実験は、提案された方法が以前の最先端モデルを上回ることを示しています。', 'ar': 'يعد التعرف على الكيان المحدد (NER) مهمة أساسية في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. تعامل الأعمال الحديثة التعرف على الكيانات المسماة كمهمة قراءة وفهم ، وإنشاء استعلامات خاصة بالنوع يدويًا لاستخراج الكيانات. يعاني هذا النموذج من ثلاث قضايا. أولاً ، يمكن للاستعلامات الخاصة بالنوع استخراج نوع واحد فقط من الكيانات لكل استنتاج ، وهو أمر غير فعال. ثانيًا ، يتم عزل الاستخراج لأنواع الكيانات المختلفة ، مع تجاهل التبعيات بينها. ثالثًا ، يعتمد إنشاء الاستعلام على المعرفة الخارجية ويصعب تطبيقه على سيناريوهات واقعية بمئات أنواع الكيانات. للتعامل معهم ، نقترح شبكة استعلام المثيل المتوازي (PIQN) ، التي تُنشئ استعلامات مثيل عالمية وقابلة للتعلم لاستخراج الكيانات من جملة بطريقة متوازية. يتنبأ كل استعلام عن مثيل بكيان واحد ، ومن خلال تغذية جميع استعلامات المثيلات في وقت واحد ، يمكننا الاستعلام عن جميع الكيانات على التوازي. بدلاً من أن يتم بناؤها من المعرفة الخارجية ، يمكن أن تتعلم استعلامات المثال دلالات الاستعلام المختلفة أثناء التدريب. لتدريب النموذج ، نتعامل مع تعيين الملصق على أنه مشكلة تعيين خطية من واحد إلى عدة (LAP) ونخصص كيانات ذهبية ديناميكيًا لاستعلامات المثيل بأقل تكلفة تعيين. توضح التجارب على مجموعات بيانات NER المتداخلة والمسطحة أن طريقتنا المقترحة تتفوق في الأداء على أحدث النماذج السابقة.', 'es': 'El reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) es una tarea fundamental en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Los trabajos recientes tratan el reconocimiento de entidades con nombre como una tarea de comprensión lectora, y crean consultas específicas de tipo manualmente para extraer entidades. Este paradigma adolece de tres problemas. En primer lugar, las consultas específicas de tipo solo pueden extraer un tipo de entidades por inferencia, lo cual es ineficiente. En segundo lugar, la extracción de los diferentes tipos de entidades está aislada, ignorando las dependencias entre ellas. En tercer lugar, la construcción de consultas se basa en conocimientos externos y es difícil de aplicar a escenarios realistas con cientos de tipos de entidades. Para abordarlos, proponemos Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), que establece consultas de instancias globales y aprendibles para extraer entidades de una oración de forma paralela. Cada consulta de instancia predice una entidad y, al alimentar todas las consultas de instancia simultáneamente, podemos consultar todas las entidades en paralelo. En lugar de construirse a partir de conocimientos externos, las consultas de instancia pueden aprender sus diferentes semánticas de consultas durante el entrenamiento. Para entrenar el modelo, tratamos la asignación de etiquetas como un problema de asignación lineal (LAP) de uno a muchos y asignamos de forma dinámica entidades Gold a consultas de instancias con un coste de asignación mínimo. Los experimentos en conjuntos de datos NER anidados y planos demuestran que nuestro método propuesto supera a los modelos anteriores de última generación.', 'ru': 'Распознавание именованных сущностей (NER) является фундаментальной задачей в обработке естественного языка. Недавние работы рассматривают распознавание именованных сущностей как задачу понимания чтения, создавая запросы типа вручную для извлечения сущностей. Эта парадигма страдает от трех проблем. Во-первых, запросы типа могут извлекать только один тип сущностей для каждого вывода, что является неэффективным. Во-вторых, извлечение для различных типов сущностей изолировано, игнорируя зависимости между ними. В-третьих, построение запросов основывается на внешних знаниях и с трудом применимо к реалистичным сценариям с сотнями типов сущностей. Чтобы справиться с ними, мы предлагаем Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), которая устанавливает глобальные и обучаемые запросы экземпляров для параллельного извлечения сущностей из предложения. Каждый запрос экземпляра предсказывает одну сущность, и, подавая все запросы экземпляра одновременно, мы можем запрашивать все сущности параллельно. Вместо того, чтобы строиться на внешних знаниях, запросы виртуальных машин могут изучать свою разную семантику запросов во время обучения. Для обучения модели мы рассматриваем присвоение меток как задачу линейного присвоения во многих случаях (LAP) и динамически назначаем золотые сущности запросам виртуальных машин с минимальными затратами на присвоение. Эксперименты с вложенными и плоскими наборами данных NER показывают, что предлагаемый нами метод превосходит предыдущие современные модели.', 'hi': 'नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक मौलिक कार्य है। हाल के कार्यों को एक पठन समझ कार्य के रूप में नामित एंटिटी पहचान का इलाज करते हैं, संस्थाओं को निकालने के लिए मैन्युअल रूप से प्रकार-विशिष्ट क्वेरी का निर्माण करते हैं। यह प्रतिमान तीन मुद्दों से ग्रस्त है। सबसे पहले, प्रकार-विशिष्ट क्वेरी प्रति अनुमान केवल एक प्रकार की संस्थाओं को निकाल सकती हैं, जो अक्षम है। दूसरा, विभिन्न प्रकार की संस्थाओं के लिए निष्कर्षण अलग-थलग है, उनके बीच निर्भरताओं को अनदेखा करता है। तीसरा, क्वेरी निर्माण बाहरी ज्ञान पर निर्भर करता है और सैकड़ों एंटिटी प्रकारों के साथ यथार्थवादी परिदृश्यों पर लागू करना मुश्किल है। उनसे निपटने के लिए, हम समानांतर इंस्टेंस क्वेरी नेटवर्क (PIQN) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो समानांतर तरीके से एक वाक्य से संस्थाओं को निकालने के लिए वैश्विक और सीखने योग्य इंस्टेंस क्वेरी सेट करता है। प्रत्येक आवृत्ति क्वेरी एक एंटिटी की भविष्यवाणी करती है, और सभी इंस्टेंस क्वेरीज़ को एक साथ खिलाकर, हम समानांतर में सभी एंटिटीज़ क्वेरी कर सकते हैं। बाहरी ज्ञान से निर्मित होने के बजाय, इंस्टेंस क्वेरी प्रशिक्षण के दौरान अपने विभिन्न क्वेरी शब्दार्थ सीख सकते हैं। मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए, हम लेबल असाइनमेंट को एक-से-कई रैखिक असाइनमेंट समस्या (एलएपी) के रूप में मानते हैं और गतिशील रूप से न्यूनतम असाइनमेंट लागत के साथ उदाहरण प्रश्नों के लिए सोने की संस्थाओं को असाइन करते हैं। नेस्टेड और फ्लैट एनईआर डेटासेट दोनों पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि पिछले अत्याधुनिक मॉडलों को मात देती है।', 'zh': '名实知之 (NER) 自然语言治之一务也。 近事以名识为读解,手动构特定于类者询而取之。 此范式有三。 先特定者,每推理取一实,低效也。 其次,异类者取孤立,忽其所恃。 其三曰,询构赖于外,难用于数百种。 询之以并行,网络(PIQN)之以全局,询之以并行。 每事询测一实,兼资一实,可并询所有。 实例询非外构,可于训练之间习其不同者问语义。 以标赋值为双多线性赋值 (LAP),以最小赋值成本分黄金实体而询之。 嵌套、平面NER数集上之实验,先先进模形。', 'ga': 'Is tasc bunúsach i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha é aitheantas aonáin ainmnithe (NER). Déileálann saothair le déanaí le haitheantas aonáin ainmnithe mar thasc léamhthuisceana, ag tógáil fiosrúcháin chineál-shonracha de láimh chun eintitis a asbhaint. Tá trí shaincheist ag baint leis an bparadigm seo. Ar an gcéad dul síos, ní féidir le fiosruithe cineál-shonracha ach cineál amháin eintiteas a bhaint as gach tátal, rud atá neamhéifeachtach. Sa dara háit, tá an t-eastóscadh le haghaidh cineálacha éagsúla eintiteas scoite amach, gan aird a thabhairt ar na spleáchais eatarthu. Ar an tríú dul síos, braitheann tógáil fiosrúchán ar eolas seachtrach agus tá sé deacair é a chur i bhfeidhm ar chásanna réalaíocha leis na céadta cineál eintiteas. Chun déileáil leo, molaimid Líonra Ceisteanna Cleachtais Comhthreomhara (PIQN), a bhunaíonn fiosrúcháin shamplacha domhanda agus infhoghlama chun aonáin a bhaint as abairt ar bhealach comhthreomhar. Déantar aonán amháin a thuar i ngach cás-iarratas, agus trí gach fiosrúchán faoi chás a chothú ag an am céanna, is féidir linn gach aonán a fhiosrú ag an am céanna. In ionad iad a bheith tógtha as eolas seachtrach, féadann fiosrúcháin mar shampla a shéimeantaic ceisteanna éagsúla a fhoghlaim le linn oiliúna. Chun an tsamhail a oiliúint, caithfimid le sannadh lipéad mar Fhadhb Aon-ar-go leor maidir le Sannadh Líneach (LAP) agus sannaimid eintitis óir go dinimiciúil le fiosrúcháin mar shampla a bhfuil costas íosta sannta orthu. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí neadaithe agus chomhréidh NER go sáraíonn an modh atá beartaithe againn na samhlacha úrscothacha roimhe seo.', 'ka': 'სახელი ინტერტის განაცნობა (NER) არის ფუნდამეტური რაოდენობა, რომელიც სახელი ენის პროცესისში. მიმდინარე სამუშაო სამუშაო ინტერტის განაცნობა როგორც კითხვის განსხვავების რაოდენობა, ტიპის განსაკუთრებული კითხვების შექმნა ხელსახულად ინტერტიების გამოკ ეს პარადიგმა სამი პრობლემების განმავლობა. პირველი, ტიპის განსაკუთრებული კითხვები შეიძლება მხოლოდ ერთი ტიპის ინტერტიკების გამოყენება, რომელიც არაფექტიურია. მეორე, განსხვავებული ინტერტიკების თექქტრექცია იზოლატიურია, მათგანი განსხვავებული განსაკუთრებულობების თექტრექცია. მესამე, კითხვა შექმნის შექმნის გარეშე ცნობიერებაზე დარწმუნება და რეალური სინარიოში ასობით ინტერტიკური ტიპების შესახებ ძალიან რთულია. ჩვენ ისინი გავაკეთებთ პარალელი ინსტანსის კითხვის ქსელი (PIQN), რომელიც გლობალური და სწავლილი ინსტანსის კითხვები დააყენებს, რომელიც პარალელური გზითით გაკეთება ინსტანსიების გა ყოველ ინსტენსტის კითხვა ერთი ინტენტიტის განსაზღვრება, და ყველა ინსტენსტის კითხვების განსაზღვრებით ერთადერთად შეგვიძლია ყველა ინტენტიტის პარალელად კ გარეშე ცნობიდან კონფიგურაცია შესაძლებელია განსხვავებული კითხვების სმენტიკების შესაძლებლობა განსხვავებული კითხვების შესახებ. მოდელის შემწყვებისთვის, ჩვენ მინიმალური დაატვირთვა პრობლემა (LAP) და დინამიკურად დაატვირთვა მოდულის ელემენტებისთვის კითხვების მინიმალური დაატვირთვა. ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც მუშაობით და მუშაობით NER მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომ ჩვენი წინა მონაცემენტი უფრო გავაკეთება წინა მონაცემების მო', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας (ΝΕΡ) αποτελεί θεμελιώδη εργασία στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Πρόσφατα έργα αντιμετωπίζουν την αναγνώριση ονομασμένων οντοτήτων ως εργασία κατανόησης ανάγνωσης, κατασκευάζοντας ερωτήματα ειδικά για τύπο με μη αυτόματο τρόπο για την εξαγωγή οντοτήτων. Αυτό το παράδειγμα πάσχει από τρία ζητήματα. Πρώτον, συγκεκριμένα ερωτήματα τύπου μπορούν να εξάγουν μόνο έναν τύπο οντοτήτων ανά συμπέρασμα, γεγονός που είναι αναποτελεσματικό. Δεύτερον, η εξαγωγή για διαφορετικούς τύπους οντοτήτων είναι απομονωμένη, αγνοώντας τις εξαρτήσεις μεταξύ τους. Τρίτον, η κατασκευή ερωτήματος βασίζεται σε εξωτερικές γνώσεις και είναι δύσκολο να εφαρμοστεί σε ρεαλιστικά σενάρια με εκατοντάδες τύπους οντοτήτων. Για να τα αντιμετωπίσουμε, προτείνουμε το Δίκτυο Παράλληλων Παρουσιών Ερωτήσεων (το οποίο δημιουργεί παγκόσμια και μαθησιακά ερωτήματα παρουσίας για την εξαγωγή οντοτήτων από μια πρόταση με παράλληλο τρόπο. Κάθε ερώτημα παρουσίας προβλέπει μια οντότητα και τροφοδοτώντας ταυτόχρονα όλα τα ερωτήματα παρουσίας, μπορούμε να εξετάσουμε όλες τις οντότητες παράλληλα. Αντί να κατασκευάζονται από εξωτερική γνώση, τα ερωτήματα παρουσίας μπορούν να μάθουν τη διαφορετική σημασιολογία ερωτήματος κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης. Για την εκπαίδευση του μοντέλου, αντιμετωπίζουμε την ανάθεση ετικετών ως ένα προς πολλά πρόβλημα γραμμικής ανάθεσης (και αντιστοιχούμε δυναμικά χρυσές οντότητες σε ερωτήματα παρουσίας με ελάχιστο κόστος ανάθεσης. Τα πειράματα τόσο σε ένθετα όσο και σε επίπεδα σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνά τα προηγούμενα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A nevezett entitás felismerése (NER) alapvető feladat a természetes nyelv feldolgozásában. A legutóbbi munkák olvasásértési feladatként kezelik a nevezett entitások felismerését, és kézzel készítenek típusspecifikus lekérdezéseket entitások kivonására. Ennek a paradigmának három problémája van. Először is, a típusspecifikus lekérdezések következtetésenként csak egy típusú entitást tudnak kivonni, ami nem hatékony. Másodszor, a különböző típusú entitások extrakciója elszigetelt, figyelmen kívül hagyva a köztük lévő függőségeket. Harmadszor, a lekérdezések építése külső ismereteken alapul, és nehéz alkalmazni reális forgatókönyvekre, amelyek több száz entitástípust tartalmaznak. Ezek kezeléséhez javasoljuk a Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), amely globális és tanulható példánykérdezéseket hoz létre, hogy párhuzamosan kivonja az entitásokat egy mondatból. Minden példánykérdezés egy entitást jósol meg, és az összes példánykérdezés egyidejű adagolásával minden entitást párhuzamosan lekérdezhetünk. Ahelyett, hogy külső ismeretekből készülnének, a példánykérdezések a képzés során megtanulhatják különböző lekérdezési szemantikájukat. A modell képzéséhez a címke-hozzárendelést egy egy a sokhoz tartozó lineáris hozzárendelési problémaként kezeljük, és dinamikusan arany entitásokat rendelünk a példánykérdezésekhez minimális hozzárendelési költséggel. A beágyazott és lapos NER adatkészleteken végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt módszerünk felülmúlja a korábbi korszerű modelleket.', 'it': "Il riconoscimento delle entità denominate (NER) è un compito fondamentale nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. I lavori recenti trattano il riconoscimento di entità con nome come un'attività di comprensione della lettura, costruendo query tipo-specifiche manualmente per estrarre entità. Questo paradigma soffre di tre problemi. In primo luogo, le query specifiche per tipo possono estrarre un solo tipo di entità per inferenza, il che è inefficiente. In secondo luogo, l'estrazione per diversi tipi di entità è isolata, ignorando le dipendenze tra di loro. In terzo luogo, la costruzione di query si basa su conoscenze esterne ed è difficile da applicare a scenari realistici con centinaia di tipi di entità. Per affrontarli, proponiamo Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), che imposta query di istanze globali e imparabili per estrarre entità da una frase in modo parallelo. Ogni query di istanza prevede un'entità e alimentando contemporaneamente tutte le query di istanza, possiamo interrogare tutte le entità in parallelo. Invece di essere costruite da conoscenze esterne, le query di istanza possono imparare la loro semantica diversa durante la formazione. Per la formazione del modello, trattiamo l'assegnazione delle etichette come un problema di assegnazione lineare uno a molti (LAP) e assegnamo dinamicamente entità gold alle query di istanza con costi di assegnazione minimi. Esperimenti su set di dati NER nidificati e piatti dimostrano che il nostro metodo proposto supera i modelli precedenti all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін негізгі тапсырма. Жуырдағы жұмыстар аталған нысандарды оқу тапсырмасы ретінде анықтау, нысандарды тарқату үшін түрінің ерекше сұраныстарын қолмен құру. Бұл парадигма үш мәселеден тұрады. Біріншіден, түрінің ерекше сұраныстары тек бір түрлі нысандарды тарқатып алуға болады, бұл жеткілікті емес. Екіншіден, түрлі бірліктердің түрлерінің тарқатуы бөлек, олардың арасындағы тәуелдіктерін елемейді. Үшінші, сұраныс құрылымы сыртқы білімдеріне тәуелді және жүздеген бөлім түрлерінің реалистикалық сценариясына қолдану қиын. Оларға қатынау үшін біз параллель инстанциялық сұраныс желі (PIQN) деп ұсынамыз. Бұл жалпы және оқылмайтын инстанциялық сұраныстарды сұраныстарды параллель түрде тазалады. Әрбір инстанция сұраныс бір нысанды алдын алады, және барлық инстанциялар сұраныстарын бірден беріп, барлық нысандарды параллель сұрауға болады. Сыртқы білімдерден құрылған орнына, мысал сұрақтары өзінің әртүрлі сұрақтар семантикасын үйрене алады. Үлгілерді оқыту үшін, сілтемелерді бір- біріне сызық келтіру мәселесі ретінде (LAP) және динамикалық алтын бөліктерді мысал сұрауларына төменгі келтіру бағалары болады. Біздің таңдалған және кәдімгі NER деректер жиындарының тәжірибелері біздің таңдалған тәжірибеміздің алдыңғы орындау үлгілерін өзгертеді.', 'mk': 'Признавањето на именуваниот ентитет (NER) е фундаментална задача во природното обработување јазик. Неодамнешните дела го третираат препознавањето на именуваниот ентитет како задача за разбирање на читањето, конструирајќи рачно прашања специфични за тип за извлекување ентитети. This paradigm suffers from three issues.  Прво, прашањата специфични за тип можат да извадат само еден тип на ентитети по инференција, што е неефикасно. Второ, извлекувањето за различни типови на ентитети е изолирано, игнорирајќи ги зависностите меѓу нив. Трето, изградбата на прашања зависи од надворешно знаење и е тешко да се примени на реални сценарија со стотици типови на ентитети. За да се справиме со нив, предлагаме мрежа за прашања во паралелна инстанца (PIQN), која поставува глобални и научливи прашања во инстанца за извлекување на ентитети од реченица на паралелен начин. Секое прашање на инстанции предвидува еден ентитет, и со предавање на сите инстанции истовремено, можеме да ги прашаме сите ентитети паралелно. Instead of being constructed from external knowledge, instance queries can learn their different query semantics during training.  За обуката на моделот, ние ја третираме задачата на етикетата како проблем на еден до многу линијарни задачи (ЛАП) и динамично ги додаваме златните ентитети на пример прашања со минимална цена на задача. Експериментите на гнездени и плочни податоци на НЕР покажуваат дека нашиот предложен метод ги надминува претходните најнови модели.', 'lt': 'Pavadintojo subjekto pripažinimas (NER) yra pagrindinė gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotis. Neseniai atliktuose darbuose vardinio subjekto pripažinimas laikomas skaitymo supratimo užduotimi, rengiant konkrečiam tipui būdingus klausimus rankiniu būdu ištraukti subjektus. This paradigm suffers from three issues.  Pirma, konkrečiam tipui būdingi klausimai gali išskirti tik vieną subjektų tipą, kuris yra neveiksmingas. Antra, skirtingų rūšių subjektų gavyba yra atskirta, ignoruojant tarpusavio priklausomybę. Trečia, užklausų statyba grindžiama išorės žiniomis ir sunku taikyti realistiniams scenarijams, kuriuose yra šimtai subjektų tipų. Siekiant spręsti šiuos klausimus, siūlome lygiagrečios instancijos klausimų tinklą (PIQN), kuris sukuria visuotinius ir pasimokomų instancijų klausimus, kad subjektai būtų lygiagrečiai ištraukti iš sakinio. Kiekviename atvejo klausyme numatomas vienas subjektas, ir vienu metu pateikiant visus atvejus, galime klausti visus subjektus lygiagrečiai. Vietoj to, kad jie būtų sukurti iš išorinių žinių, pavyzdžių klausimų mokymo metu gali išsiaiškinti skirtingą klausimų semantiką. Mokydami model į, mes vertiname etiketės priskyrimą kaip vieną ar daugelį linijinio priskyrimo problemų (LAP) ir dinamiškai priskyrimo aukso subjektams, pavyzdžiui, užklausoms su minimaliomis priskyrimo išlaidomis. Eksperimentai naudojant ir nestingus, ir plokščius NER duomenų rinkinius rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas metodas atitinka ankstesnius moderniausius modelius.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) adalah tugas asas dalam pemprosesan bahasa alami. Kerja baru-baru ini memperlakukan pengenalan entiti bernama sebagai tugas pemahaman pembacaan, membangun pertanyaan-jenis-spesifik secara manual untuk mengekstrak entiti. Paradigma ini menderita dari tiga isu. Pertama, pertanyaan-spesifik jenis hanya boleh mengekstrak satu jenis entiti per kesimpulan, yang tidak berkesan. Kedua, pengekstrakan bagi jenis entiti yang berbeza adalah terisolasi, mengabaikan dependensi diantaranya. Ketiga, pembangunan pertanyaan bergantung pada pengetahuan luaran dan sukar untuk dilaksanakan pada skenario realistik dengan ratusan jenis entiti. Untuk menangani mereka, kami cadangkan Rangkaian Pertanyaan Kejadian Paralel (PIQN), yang menetapkan pertanyaan kejadian global dan boleh belajar untuk mengekstrak entiti dari kalimat secara paralel. Setiap pertanyaan contoh meramalkan satu entiti, dan dengan memberi makan semua pertanyaan contoh secara serentak, kita boleh tanya semua entiti secara serentak. Daripada dibina dari pengetahuan luaran, pertanyaan contoh boleh belajar semantik pertanyaan berbeza mereka semasa latihan. For training the model, we treat label assignment as a one-to-many Linear Assignment Problem (LAP) and dynamically assign gold entities to instance queries with minimal assignment cost.  Eksperimen kedua-dua set data NER tersarang dan rata menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami diusulkan melampaui model-state-of-the-art terdahulu.', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent tal-entità msejħa (NER) huwa kompitu fundamentali fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Xogħlijiet reċenti jittrattaw ir-rikonoxximent tal-entità msemmija bħala kompitu ta’ fehim tal-qari, billi jinbnew mistoqsijiet speċifiċi għat-tip manwalment biex jiġu estratti entitajiet. Dan il-paradigma jsofri minn tliet kwistjonijiet. L-ewwel nett, mistoqsijiet speċifiċi għat-tip jistgħu jestraġu biss tip wieħed ta’ entitajiet għal kull inferenza, li huwa ineffiċjenti. It-tieni nett, l-estrazzjoni għal tipi differenti ta’ entitajiet hija iżolata, filwaqt li jiġu injorati d-dipendenzi bejniethom. It-tielet, il-kostruzzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet tiddependi fuq l-għarfien estern u hija diffiċli li tapplika għal xenarji realistiċi b’mijiet ta’ tipi ta’ entitajiet. To deal with them, we propose Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), which sets up global and learnable instance queries to extract entities from a sentence in a parallel manner.  Kull mistoqsija tal-istanza tipprevedi entità waħda, u billi tagħti l-mistoqsijiet tal-istanza kollha fl-istess ħin, nistgħu nistaqsu lill-entitajiet kollha b’mod parallel. Minflok jinbnew minn għarfien estern, mistoqsijiet ta’ eżempju jistgħu jitgħallmu s-semantika differenti tagħhom ta’ mistoqsijiet waqt it-taħriġ. Għat-taħriġ tal-mudell, jittrattaw l-assenjazzjoni tat-tikketta bħala problema ta’ assenjazzjoni lineari (LAP) minn wieħed għal ħafna u assenjaw b’mod dinamiku entitajiet tad-deheb biex jeżaminaw mistoqsijiet bi spiża minima ta’ assenjazzjoni. L-esperimenti kemm fuq settijiet tad-dejta NER imnixxfa kif ukoll fuq settijiet ċatti juru li l-metodu propost tagħna jaqbeż il-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati preċedenti.', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട വസ്തുവിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് (NER) സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയതയില്\u200d  അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുവാന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പേരുള്ള സാധാരണ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത മൂന്നു പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ പാരാഡിമം വേദനിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം, ടൈപ്പ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അപകടത്തിന് ഒരു തരം വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d മാത്രമേ പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയു രണ്ടാമത്, വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നതാണ്, അവയ്ക്കിടയിലുള്ള ആ മൂന്നാമത്, നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം ചോദിക്കുന്നത് പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവിനെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. നൂറുകണക്കിന് വസ്തുക്കളുടെ തരം കൊണ്ട് യഥ അവരോട് കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പാരാള്\u200dഎല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dസ്റ്റെന്\u200dസ് വെര്\u200dക്ക് ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു (പിഐക്യൂന്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു) അത് ഒരു താല എല്ലാ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളും ചോദ്യം ഒരു വസ്തുവെക്കുറിച്ചും പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളെയും അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമുക്ക് ഒരേ  പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം ഉദാഹരണത്തിനുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ലേബിലേറ്റിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായത്തെ ഒരു ലൈന്\u200dലൈന്\u200d അസിഗന്മെന്റ് പ്രശ്നമാക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ വസ്ത Experiments on both nested and flat NER datasets demonstrate that our proposed method outperforms previous state-of-the-art models.', 'mn': 'Нэр нэрлэгдсэн entity recognition (NER) бол байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн үндсэн ажил юм. Саяхан ажиллах нь унших ойлголтын ажил гэж нэрлэгдсэн бүтэц хүлээн зөвшөөрөх ажиллагаа, төрлийн тодорхойлолтой квадратуудыг барилгаар бүтээж байдаг. Энэ парадигм гурван асуудалтай. Эхлээд, төрлийн тодорхойлолтой квери нь зөвхөн халдвар тутамд нэг төрлийн бүтээгдэхүүн гаргаж чадна. Энэ нь үр ашиггүй. Хоёрдугаарт, өөр төрлийн биетүүдийн хамааралтай холбоотой бөгөөд тэдний хоорондын хамааралтай байдлыг үгүйсгэдэг. Гурав дахь, query бүтээл нь гадаад мэдлэгтэй хамааралтай бөгөөд бодит хувилбарууд дээр зуун төрлийн бүтээгдэхүүний хувилбарууд ашиглах нь хэцүү. Тэднээс хамт ажиллахын тулд бид параллел Instance Query Network (PIQN) санал болгож байна. Энэ нь дэлхийн болон суралцах үйл явц асуудлыг параллел аргаар өгүүлбэрээс хүмүүсийг гаргахад зориулдаг. Огторгууд бүр нэг бүтээгдэхүүнийг тодорхойлж, мөн бүх инстанц квадратуудыг хамтдаа хандуулахад бид бүх бүтээгдэхүүнийг параллел хэлбэрээр шалгаж чадна. Шинэ мэдлэгтэй бүтээгдэхүүний оронд, жишээлбэл квери суралцах үед өөр төрлийн квери semantics суралцах боломжтой. Загварын сургалтын тулд бид загварын загварын загварыг нэг-нэг хүртэл олон загварын асуудал (ЛАП) гэж үздэг. Тэгээд алт загварын загварын бага зардалтай кверитүүд болно. НЭР өгөгдлийн сангуудын туршилтууд нь бидний санал өгсөн арга нь өмнөх урлагийн загварыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Namnet entitetskjenning (NER) er ein grunnleggjande oppgåve i naturspråkshandtering. Nyleg behandlar oppgåver med namnet entitetskjenning som oppgåve for lesingforståking, og byrjar oppgåver med type-spesifikke spørjingar manuelt for å pakka ut einingar. Denne paradigmen går frå tre problemer. Først kan type-spesifikke spørjingar berre pakke ut eitt type einingar per infeksjon, som er ugyldig. Ekstraksjonen for ulike typar einingar er isolert, og ignorerer avhengigheten mellom dei. Tredje, spørjingsbruk er avhengig av eksterne kunnskap og er vanskeleg å bruka på realistiske scenarioar med hundre av einingstypar. For å handsama dei, foreslår vi parallelle spørjingsnarveg (PIQN), som setjer opp globale og lærbar instans spørjingar for å pakka ut einingar frå eit setning på parallell måte. Kvar instans spørjing foregår ein entitet, og ved å kjema inn alle instansaspørjingar samtidig kan vi spørja alle entiteter samtidig. I staden for å bli konstruert frå eksterne kunnskap, kan eksempel spørjingar lære sine ulike spørsmålssemantikk under opplæring. For å opplæra modellen, behandler vi merkelappen som eit problem med ei til mange lineær tilordning (LAP) og dynamisk tilordna gullene til eksempel spørjingar med minimale tilordning. Eksperimentar på både nesterte og flate NER-datasett viser at vår foreslått metode utfører førre modeller for kunsten.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek (NER) jest podstawowym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Ostatnie prace traktują rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek jako zadanie zrozumienia odczytu, konstruując ręcznie zapytania typowe w celu wyodrębnienia jednostek. Ten paradygmat cierpi z powodu trzech problemów. Po pierwsze, zapytania typowe mogą wyodrębnić tylko jeden typ jednostek na wniosek, co jest nieefektywne. Po drugie, ekstrakcja dla różnych typów podmiotów jest odizolowana, ignorując zależności między nimi. Po trzecie, konstrukcja zapytań opiera się na zewnętrznej wiedzy i trudno jest zastosować do realistycznych scenariuszy z setkami typów podmiotów. Aby sobie z nimi poradzić, proponujemy równoległą sieć zapytań instancji (PIQN), która konfiguruje globalne i możliwe do nauki zapytania instancji, aby równolegle wyodrębnić podmioty ze zdania. Każde zapytanie instancji przewiduje jedną jednostkę, a poprzez jednoczesne podawanie wszystkich zapytań instancji możemy zapytać wszystkie jednostki równolegle. Zamiast być konstruowane z zewnętrznej wiedzy, zapytania instancyjne mogą nauczyć się różnej semantyki zapytań podczas szkolenia. Przy szkoleniu modelu traktujemy przypisywanie etykiet jako jeden-do-wielu Linear Assignment Problem (LAP) i dynamicznie przypisujemy złote jednostki do zapytań instancyjnych przy minimalnych kosztach przypisania. Eksperymenty zarówno na zagnieżdżonych, jak i płaskich zbiorach danych NER pokazują, że proponowana metoda przewyższa poprzednie najnowocześniejsze modele.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) este o sarcină fundamentală în procesarea limbajului natural. Lucrările recente tratează recunoașterea entităților denumite ca o sarcină de înțelegere a citirii, construind interogări specifice tipului manual pentru a extrage entități. Această paradigmă suferă de trei probleme. În primul rând, interogările specifice tipului pot extrage un singur tip de entități per inferență, ceea ce este ineficient. În al doilea rând, extragerea pentru diferite tipuri de entități este izolată, ignorând dependențele dintre ele. În al treilea rând, construcția interogărilor se bazează pe cunoștințe externe și este dificil de aplicat scenariilor realiste cu sute de tipuri de entități. Pentru a face față acestora, propunem Rețeaua de interogare a instanțelor paralele (PIQN), care stabilește interogări globale și care pot fi învățate pentru a extrage entități dintr-o propoziție în mod paralel. Fiecare interogare de instanță prezice o entitate, iar prin alimentarea simultană a tuturor interogărilor de instanță, putem interoga toate entitățile în paralel. În loc să fie construite din cunoștințe externe, interogările de instanță pot învăța semantica lor diferită de interogare în timpul instruirii. Pentru instruirea modelului, tratăm atribuirea etichetelor ca o problemă de atribuire liniară unu-la-mulți (LAP) și atribuim dinamic entități gold interogărilor de instanță cu costuri minime de atribuire. Experimentele pe seturi de date NER atât cuibărite, cât și plate demonstrează că metoda propusă depășește modelele anterioare de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) je osnovni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Nedavni rad tretira priznanje entiteta po imenu kao zadatak razumevanja čitanja, izgradnju specifičnih pitanja tipa ručno za izvlačenje entiteta. Ova paradigma pati od tri problema. Prvo, specifične ispitivanja tipa mogu izvući samo jednu vrstu entiteta po infekciji, koja je neiefikasna. Drugo, ekstrakcija za različite vrste entiteta je izolirana, ignorišući zavisnosti između njih. Treće, postavljanje pitanja oslanja na spoljno znanje i teško je da se primjenjuje na realističke scenarije sa stotinama vrsta entiteta. Da bismo se suočili sa njima, predlažemo Paralelnu Instancijsku Internetu (PIQN), koja postavlja globalnu i učenu instancu pitanja za izvlačenje entiteta iz rečenice na paralelni način. Svaki primer pitanje predviđa jednu entitetu, a hraneći sve primere istovremeno, možemo ispitati sve entitate paralelno. Umesto da se izgradi iz spoljnih znanja, ispitivanja na primer mogu naučiti različite ispitivanje semantike tokom treninga. Za obuku model a, tretiramo dodatke etiketa kao problem sa jednim na mnogim linijskim dodatkama (LAP) i dinamički dodajemo zlatnim entitetima na primer pitanja sa minimalnim troškovima zadataka. Eksperimenti na nestalim i ravnim podacima NER pokazuju da naša predložena metoda iznosi prethodne modele umetnosti.', 'si': 'නම් කිරීමට තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණය (NER) තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනයේ ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩක්. අලුත් වැඩේ නම් අයිති අයිතියක් අඳුරගන්න කියලා කියවන්න පුළුවන් වැඩක් විදියට, ප්\u200dරකාරයක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මුලින්, විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප දෙවෙනියි, වෙනස් වර්ගයක් වගේ වර්ගයක් වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණය විතරයි, ඔවුන්ගේ අතර ඉන්න අවශ්\u200dයතාවක තුන්වෙනියි, ප්\u200dරශ්න නිර්මාණය පුළුවන් පුළුවන් දන්නවට විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සීයක්  ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ජාලය (PIQN) කිරීමට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ජාතික සහ ප හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම එක අවස්ථාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම එකම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්න පුරුද්ගලික දන්නයෙන් නිර්මාණය වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, උදාහරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන් ඔවුන්ග මොඩේල් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි ලේබෙල් සැකසුම් එකක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ලිනියර් සැකසුම් විදියට (LAP) වගේම ලේබෙල් සැකසුම පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය NER දත්ත සේට් වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක', 'so': "Aqoonsashada qofka la magacaabay (NER) waa shaqo aasaasi ah oo ku baaraandegista luqada asalka ah. Shaqooyinka ugu dambeeyay waxay u macaamiloodaan aqoonsiga aqoonsiga aqoonsiga entity sida shaqada aasaaska ah oo la akhriyey, dhisidda su'aalo cayiman oo ay si gacan ah ugu soo saaraan alaabta. Faahfaankan waxay ka xanuunsadaan saddex arin. Marka ugu horeysa, su'aalo cayiman oo cayiman oo kaliya waxay soo saari karaan isku nooc oo ay jiraan, taasoo aan ahayn mid ku filan. Second, soo saarista waxyaabo kala duduwan waa gooni, wuxuuna ka tegayaa ku xirnaanta dhexdooda. Saddexda, dhismaha dalbashada waxay ku xiran tahay aqoonta dibadda ah, waana adag tahay in la codsado muuqashada rasmiga ah oo ay leeyihiin boqolaal noocyo oo jacayl ah. Si aan loola macaamilo, waxaannu u soo jeedaynaa shabakadda Iskuulka Parallel (PIQN), kaas oo u qoraya su'aalaha caalamiga ah iyo wax baran karta si loo soo bixiyo entities si lamid ah. Tusaale kasta oo aad wax weydiisid ayaa hal jidh ah ka hor dooranaya, isla markaasna waxaynu sameyn karnaa in aan isku si siman wax u weydiinno wax walba. Inta aan laguugu sameyn karo aqoonta dibadda, tusaale ahaan su'aaluhu waxay baran karaan isbitaalooyinkooda oo kala duduwan xilliga waxbarashada. Isku tababarinta tusaale ahaan waxaynu u isticmaalnaa qasabka wargelinta qoraalka sida dhibaatooyinka hal-ilaa-badan (LAP) oo aad si dhaqdhaqaaqsan u sameynaysaa macluumaad dahab ah tusaale ahaan su'aalaha ugu yaraan qasabka. Imtixaanka ku saabsan labada buuxda iyo meelaha loo soo bandhigay ee NER-da waxay muujiyaan in qaabkeenkeennu uu ka soo jeedo qaababka hore ee qoraalka farshaxanka.", 'sv': 'Namngivn entitetsigenkänning (NER) är en grundläggande uppgift i naturlig språkbehandling. Senaste arbeten behandlar namngiven entitetsigenkänning som en läsförståelse och skapar typspecifika frågor manuellt för att extrahera entiteter. Detta paradigm lider av tre frågor. För det första kan typspecifika frågor bara extrahera en typ av entiteter per slutsats, vilket är ineffektivt. För det andra är extraktionen för olika typer av entiteter isolerad, bortsett från beroenden mellan dem. För det tredje bygger frågekonstruktionen på extern kunskap och är svårt att tillämpa på realistiska scenarier med hundratals entitetstyper. För att hantera dem föreslår vi Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), som ställer in globala och lärbara instansfrågor för att extrahera entiteter från en mening på ett parallellt sätt. Varje instansfråga förutspår en entitet, och genom att mata alla instansfrågor samtidigt kan vi fråga alla entiteter parallellt. Istället för att konstrueras utifrån extern kunskap kan instansfrågor lära sig sin olika frågesemantik under utbildningen. För att utbilda modellen behandlar vi etiketttilldelning som ett LAP (one-to-many Linear Assignment Problem) och tilldelar dynamiskt guldentiteter till instansfrågor med minimal tilldelningskostnad. Experiment på både kapslade och platta NER datauppsättningar visar att vår föreslagna metod överträffar tidigare toppmoderna modeller.', 'ta': 'பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடிப்படையான செயல் சமீபத்தில் செயல்கள் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் குறிப்பிட்ட கேள்விகளை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு கைமுறையாக உருவாக்குகிறது. இந்த அளபுரு மூன்று பிரச்சனைகளில் இருந்து வேதனை செய்கிறது. முதலில், குறிப்பிட்ட கேள்வி இரண்டாவது, வேறு வகையான பொருளுக்கான வெளியேற்றம் தனிப்பட்டு, அவைகளுக்கிடையே சார்புகளை புறக்கணிக்கிறது. மூன்றாவது, கேள்வி கட்டுப்பாடு வெளி அறிவை நம்புகிறது மற்றும் நூறு பொருள் வகைகளை பயன்படுத்த முடியாது. இணையான வாக்கியத்திலிருந்து பொருட்களை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் இணையான வாக்கியத்தில் இருந்து பொருள்களை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு பொருளை அமைக்க @ info வெளி அறிவிலிருந்து உருவாக்கப்படுவதற்கு பதிலாக, உதாரணமாக கேள்விகள் பயிற்சியில் அவர்களுடைய வேறு கேள்வி அருத் மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்வதற்கு, நாம் விளக்கச்சீட்டு ஒதுக்கீட்டு செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறோம் ஒரு கோடு பிரச்சனை (LAP) மற்றும் தானாகவே தங்க பொருள கூடுதல் மற்றும் பிளாட் NER தரவுத்தளங்கள் இருந்தும் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையை செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'نام لیا گیٹی شناسایی (NER) طبیعی زبان پردازش میں ایک بنیادی کام ہے. اچھے کاروں میں نام کی آنٹیٹی کی پہچان کو ایک پڑھنے کی سمجھنے کی کوشش کے طور پر سمجھ لیتے ہیں، ایک ٹیٹی اٹھانے کے لئے ایک طرح کے مطابق سواریوں کو اٹھانے کے لئے مطابق بنا لیتے ہیں. یہ پاراڈیگ تین مسائل سے ہے۔ پہلے، ٹائپ کے مطابق مخصوص سوال صرف ایک ٹائپ کے ایک ٹائپ نکال سکتے ہیں، جو بے فائدہ ہے. دوسرا، مختلف مختلف مختلف مختلف مخلوقات کے لئے استخراج ہے، ان کے درمیان اعتباری کو نادانی کرتا ہے. تیسری، سؤال بنانے کا خارج علم پر اعتماد ہے اور سہرے انستی طریقوں کے ساتھ واقعی سینارییوں پر لازم کرنا مشکل ہے. ان کے ساتھ عمل کرنے کے لئے ہم پارالئل انٹنسس کوئر نیٹ ورک (PIQN) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ایک مجموعہ سے جہالت اور سکھنے والی مطابق سوال کرتا ہے۔ ہر نمونہ کے سوال ایک ایٹنی کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے، اور ہر نمونہ کے سوال ایک دوسرے سے کھانے کے ذریعہ، ہم تمام ایٹنیٹیوں کو مشابہ طور پر سوال کرسکتے ہیں. بیرونی علم سے بنایا جاتا ہے، مثال سؤال کی تعلیم کے وقت اپنے مختلف سؤال سیمانٹیکوں کو سیکھ سکتے ہیں. نمڈل کی تعلیم کے لئے، ہم لیبل کے ذریعہ ایک-بسیاری لینیر تقدیم مشکل (LAP) کے طور پر لیبل تعلیم کریں گے اور ان کے ذریعہ ذریعہ تعلیم کے مطابق ذریعہ کے ذریعہ ذریعہ کے ذریعہ سونے کے ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذ نائستہ اور فلاٹ نیر ڈاٹ سٹ کے دونوں تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ پہلے کی حالت-آرت موڈل کو اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Named entity recognition (NER) is a fundamental task in natural language processing.  @ info Bu paradigm uchta muammolardan uchta muammolar. Birinchi harfdan foydalanilgan soʻrovlar faqat bir tur narsa mavjud emas. Ikkinchi so'zda, boshqa turli obʼektlarni ajratish, ularning orasidagi qo'llanmalarni eʼtibor beradi. Uchinchi, soʻrov quyidagi tashqi ilimni tashqi taʼminga ishlatadi va aslida aniqlik scenariyatlarni yuzlab qo'llash juda qiyin. Ularni boshqarish uchun Parallel saqlash soʻrovi tarmoq (PIQN) talab qilamiz. Bu muammola va o'rganish mumkin masalan soʻzlarni bir so'zdan chiqarish uchun muammolar soʻzlarini o'zgartiradi. Har bir misol qoʻllaniladi bitta obʼekt oldini oldin, hamma misol soʻrovlarini bir xil soʻrov bilan boshqa so'zlarni soʻrashingiz mumkin. Tashqi maʼlumotdan yaratishdan oʻrniga, masalan soʻrovlar taʼminlovchi vaqtda boshqa soʻrov semantika o'rganadi. Modelni tahrirlash uchun, biz bir necha necha chiziqning muammolari (LAP) sifatida yozib qo'llanmalarni boshqaramiz va, masalan, kichkina vazifalar qiymati bilan yuqori narsalarni aniqlash mumkin. Name", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng thực thể có tên là một nhiệm vụ cơ bản trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Các công trình gần đây coi nhận dạng thực thể tên là một nhiệm vụ hiểu biết, kiến tạo các câu hỏi kiểu đặc biệt để thực thể trích ra. Biểu mẫu này ba vấn đề. Thứ nhất, các câu hỏi cụ thể chỉ có thể trích ra một loại thực thể cho mỗi kết luận, mà không hiệu quả. Thứ hai, các loại thực thể khác nhau được tách ra, lờ đi các mối quan hệ phụ thuộc giữa họ. Thứ ba, việc xây dựng các câu hỏi dựa trên kiến thức bên ngoài và rất khó áp dụng cho các viễn cảnh hiện thực với hàng trăm kiểu thực thể. Để xử lý chúng, chúng tôi đề xuất mạng Điều tra hỗn loạn Thể hiện (PIQN), nó tạo ra các câu hỏi về các trường thể hiện to àn cầu và dễ bị lộ để xóa sổ thực thể từ một bản án theo một cách song song. Mỗi câu hỏi tiến trình dự đoán một thực thể, và bằng cách cung cấp tất cả các câu hỏi tiến trình cùng nhau, chúng ta có thể truy vấn tất cả các thực thể song song. Thay vì được xây dựng dựa trên kiến thức bên ngoài, các cuộc thẩm vấn có thể học các nghi thức khác nhau trong khi tập luyện. Để huấn luyện mô hình, chúng tôi coi nhiệm vụ nhãn là một-tới-nhiều Bài to án thuộc tuyến (LAP) và đặt đặt các thực thể vàng theo động lực để tiến hành các yêu cầu với mức chi phí phân công tác tối thiểu. Thí nghiệm trên cả các tập tin cá nhân và cái đĩa nằm nướng cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội trước các mẫu hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Разпознаването на наименовани субекти (НЕР) е основна задача в обработката на естествения език. Последните произведения третират разпознаването на имена на обекти като задача за разбиране на четенето, конструирайки ръчно специфични типове заявки за извличане на обекти. Тази парадигма страда от три въпроса. Първо, специфичните за типа заявки могат да извличат само един тип обекти на заключение, което е неефективно. Второ, извличането на различни видове субекти е изолирано, пренебрегвайки зависимостите между тях. Трето, изграждането на заявки разчита на външни знания и е трудно да се приложи към реалистични сценарии със стотици типове обекти. За да се справим с тях, предлагаме мрежа за заявки за паралелни инстанции (която създава глобални и разбираеми заявки за инстанции, за да извлича същности от изречение паралелно. Всяка заявка за инстанция прогнозира едно цяло и като подаваме всички заявки за инстанции едновременно, можем да правим заявка за всички обекти паралелно. Вместо да бъдат конструирани от външни знания, заявките за инстанции могат да научат различната семантика на заявките по време на обучението. За обучението на модела ние третираме задаването на етикети като проблем с линейното задаване от един към много и динамично задаваме златни единици на заявки за инстанции с минимална цена за задаване. Експерименти както върху вложени, така и върху плоски набори от данни показват, че предложеният ни метод превъзхожда предишните най-съвременни модели.', 'da': 'Navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER) er en grundlæggende opgave i naturlig sprogbehandling. Seneste værker behandler navngivet entitetsgenkendelse som en læseforståelsesopgave og konstruerer typespecifikke forespørgsler manuelt for at udtrække entiteter. Dette paradigme lider af tre spørgsmål. For det første kan typespecifikke forespørgsler kun udtrække én type enheder pr. konklusion, hvilket er ineffektivt. For det andet er udtrækningen for forskellige typer af enheder isoleret og ignorerer afhængighederne mellem dem. For det tredje er forespørgselskonstruktion afhængig af ekstern viden og er vanskelig at anvende på realistiske scenarier med hundredvis af enhedstyper. For at håndtere dem foreslår vi Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), som opretter globale og lærbare forespørgsler til at udtrække enheder fra en sætning på en parallel måde. Hver forespørgsel forudsiger en enhed, og ved at fodre alle forespørgsler samtidig, kan vi forespørge alle enheder parallelt. I stedet for at være konstrueret ud fra ekstern viden, kan instans forespørgsler lære deres forskellige forespørgselsemantik under træning. Til uddannelse af modellen behandler vi etikettildeling som et LAP-problem (Linear Assignment Problem) og tildeler dynamisk guldenheder til forespørgsler med minimale tildelingsomkostninger. Eksperimenter på både indlejrede og flade NER datasæt viser, at vores foreslåede metode overgår tidligere state-of-the-art modeller.', 'nl': "Naamde entiteitsherkenning (NER) is een fundamentele taak in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal. Recente werken behandelen benoemde entiteitsherkenning als een leesbegrijpingstaak, waarbij typespecifieke query's handmatig worden geconstrueerd om entiteiten te extraheren. Dit paradigma lijdt aan drie problemen. Ten eerste kunnen typespecifieke query's slechts één type entiteiten per inferentie extraheren, wat inefficiënt is. Ten tweede wordt de extractie voor verschillende soorten entiteiten geïsoleerd, waarbij de afhankelijkheden tussen hen worden genegeerd. Ten derde is query constructie gebaseerd op externe kennis en is moeilijk toe te passen op realistische scenario's met honderden entiteitstypes. Om hiermee om te gaan, stellen we Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN) voor, dat globale en leerbare instancequery's instelt om entiteiten uit een zin op een parallelle manier te extraheren. Elke instancequery voorspelt één entiteit, en door alle instancequery's tegelijkertijd te voeren, kunnen we alle entiteiten parallel opvragen. In plaats van geconstrueerd te worden op basis van externe kennis, kunnen instancequery's hun verschillende query semantiek leren tijdens de training. Voor het trainen van het model behandelen we labeltoewijzing als een één-op-veel lineair toewijzingsprobleem (LAP) en wijzen we dynamische gouden entiteiten toe aan instancequery's met minimale toewijzingskosten. Experimenten met zowel geneste als platte NER-datasets tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde methode beter presteert dan eerdere state-of-the-art modellen.", 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entitata (NER) je temeljni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Nedavni radovi smatraju priznanjem entiteta imenom kao zadatak razumijevanja čitanja, izgradnju specifičnih pitanja tipa ručno za izvlačenje entitata. Ova paradigma pati od tri problema. Prvo, specifične ispitivanja tipa mogu izvući samo jednu vrstu entiteta po infekciji, što je neučinjeno. Drugo, ekstrakcija za različite vrste entiteta je izolirana, ignorirajući ovisnosti između njih. Treće, izgradnja pitanja oslanja na vanjske znanje i teško je primjenjivati na realističke scenarije s stotinama vrsta entiteta. Da bi se riješili s njima, predlažemo Parallelnu Instance Query Network (PIQN), koja postavlja globalne i učenje primjere pitanja za izvlačenje subjekta iz rečenice na paralelni način. Svaki zahtjev za primjer predviđa jednu entitetu, a hraneći sve ispitivanje instanca istovremeno, možemo ispitati sve entitate paralelno. Umjesto izgrađenja iz vanjskih znanja, ispitivanja primjerice mogu naučiti različite ispitivanje semantike tijekom treninga. Za obuku model a, smatramo dodatkom etiketa kao problem s jednim na mnogim linijskim dodatkom (LAP) i dinamički dodajemo zlatnim entitetima na primjer pitanja s minimalnim troškovima zadataka. Eksperimenti na nestalim i ravnim podacima NER pokazuju da naša predložena metoda iznosi prethodne modele umjetnosti.', 'ko': '명명 실체 식별은 자연 언어 처리의 기본 작업이다.최근의 작업은 명명 실체 식별을 읽기와 이해 작업으로 보고 특정한 유형의 조회를 수동으로 구성하여 실체를 추출한다.이런 양식에는 세 가지 문제가 존재한다.우선, 특정 유형의 조회는 매번 추리에서 하나의 유형의 실체만 추출할 수 있는데 이것은 저효과이다.그 다음으로 서로 다른 유형의 실체에 대한 추출은 고립되어 그들 간의 의존 관계를 소홀히 한다.셋째, 조회 구조는 외부 지식에 의존하고 수백 가지 실체 유형을 가진 현실 장면에 응용하기 어렵다.이러한 문제점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 전역적이고 학습 가능한 실례 조회 네트워크를 구축하고 문장에서 실체를 병렬 방식으로 추출하는 병행 실례 조회 네트워크(PIQN)를 제시했다.모든 실례 조회는 하나의 실체를 예측하고 모든 실례 조회를 동시에 제공함으로써 우리는 모든 실체를 병행적으로 조회할 수 있다.실례 조회는 훈련 과정에서 외부 지식에서 구축하는 것이 아니라 서로 다른 조회의 의미를 배울 수 있다.훈련 모델을 위해 우리는 라벨 분배를 한 쌍의 다선형 분배 문제(LAP)로 간주하고 최소한의 분배 원가로 황금 실체를 실례 조회에 동태적으로 분배한다.네스트와 평면 NER 데이터 세트에서의 실험은 우리가 제시한 방법이 이전의 가장 선진적인 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'de': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) ist eine grundlegende Aufgabe in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Neuere Arbeiten behandeln die Erkennung benannter Entitäten als Leseverständnisaufgabe und konstruieren typspezifische Abfragen manuell, um Entitäten zu extrahieren. Dieses Paradigma leidet unter drei Problemen. Erstens können typspezifische Abfragen nur einen Typ von Entitäten pro Inferenz extrahieren, was ineffizient ist. Zweitens wird die Extraktion für verschiedene Arten von Entitäten isoliert, wobei die Abhängigkeiten zwischen ihnen ignoriert werden. Drittens basiert die Abfragekonstruktion auf externem Wissen und ist schwer auf realistische Szenarien mit Hunderten von Entitätstypen anzuwenden. Um mit ihnen umzugehen, schlagen wir Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN) vor, das globale und lernbare Instance-Abfragen einrichtet, um Entitäten aus einem Satz parallel zu extrahieren. Jede Instanzanfrage sagt eine Entität voraus, und indem wir alle Instanzanfragen gleichzeitig zuführen, können wir alle Entitäten parallel abfragen. Anstatt aus externem Wissen konstruiert zu werden, können Instanzabfragen ihre unterschiedliche Abfragesemantik während des Trainings erlernen. Für die Schulung des Modells behandeln wir die Etikettenzuweisung als ein eins-zu-many Linear Assignment Problem (LAP) und weisen Instanzanfragen dynamisch Gold-Entitäten zu, bei minimalen Zuweisungskosten. Experimente an verschachtelten und flachen NER-Datensätzen zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagene Methode frühere State-of-the-Art-Modelle übertrifft.', 'id': 'Pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) adalah tugas dasar dalam proses bahasa alami. Pekerjaan baru-baru ini memperlakukan pengenalan entitas bernama sebagai tugas pemahaman pembacaan, membangun pertanyaan spesifik tipe secara manual untuk mengekstrak entitas. Paradigma ini menderita dari tiga masalah. Pertama, pertanyaan spesifik tipe hanya dapat mengekstrak satu jenis entitas per kesimpulan, yang tidak efisien. Kedua, ekstraksi untuk jenis entitas yang berbeda adalah terisolasi, mengabaikan ketergantungan antara mereka. Ketiga, konstruksi pertanyaan bergantung pada pengetahuan eksternal dan sulit diterapkan untuk skenario realistis dengan ratusan jenis entitas. Untuk menangani mereka, kami mengusulkan jaringan pertanyaan Instansi Paralel (PIQN), yang mengatur pertanyaan instansi global dan dapat dipelajari untuk mengekstrak entitas dari kalimat dengan cara paralel. Setiap pertanyaan contoh memprediksi satu entitas, dan dengan memberi makan semua pertanyaan contoh secara bersamaan, kita dapat menanyai semua entitas secara paralel. Instead of being constructed from external knowledge, instance queries can learn their different query semantics during training.  For training the model, we treat label assignment as a one-to-many Linear Assignment Problem (LAP) and dynamically assign gold entities to instance queries with minimal assignment cost.  Eksperimen pada set data NER yang tersarang dan rata menunjukkan bahwa metode kami yang diusulkan melampaui model terbaik sebelumnya.', 'fa': 'شناسایی entity نامیده شده (NER) یک کار بنیادی در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. کارهای اخیراً شناسایی entities نامیده شده را به عنوان یک کار درک خواندن، ساختن سوالات مخصوص نوع به دستی برای خروج entities. این پارادیگ از سه مشکل درد می کند. اول، سؤال\u200cهای مخصوص نوع می\u200cتوانند تنها یک نوع عنوان به عنوان بیماری خارج کنند که بی\u200cفایده است. دوم، اخراج برای نوع متفاوت از شرایط متفاوت تنها می\u200cشود، با نادیده از بستگی بین آنها. سوم، ساختمان سؤال بر علم خارجی بستگی دارد و بر سناریوهای واقعی با صدها نوع شرکت سخت است. برای استفاده با آنها، ما شبکه سوال Instance Parallel Instance Query (PIQN) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای اخراج از یک جمله به طریق متفاوتی از اجرای جهانی و یادگیری سؤال می\u200cکنند. هر مثال پرسش یک entity را پیش بینی می\u200cکند، و با تغذیه تمام مثال سوال\u200cهای همزمان می\u200cتوانیم همه\u200cی entities را همزمان بپرسیم. بجای اینکه از دانش خارجی ساخته شود، سوالات مثال می توانند در زمان آموزشی سؤال متفاوت خود را یاد بگیرند. برای آموزش مدل، ما به عنوان یک مشکل تقدیم خط\u200cبندی (LAP) برگزار می\u200cکنیم و به طور طبیعی برگزاری\u200cهای طلا را برای مثال پرسش\u200cها با هزینه\u200cهای کمینه تاخیر می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cهایی که در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای NER ساده و ساده می\u200cباشند نشان می\u200cدهند که روش پیشنهاد ما مدل\u200cهای پیشینه\u200cی هنری را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Adlanmış faýllary tanamak (NER) tebigy dil işlemesinde esasy täblikdir. Ýakynda faýllary okamak üçin bir taýdan tanamak üçin adlanan işleri taýýarlapdyr. Bu paradigm üç meseleden çykýar. Ilkinji, hilli wajyp soraglary diňe bir daşyp başarmagy üçin bir hili paket açyp biler. Bu ýerde bejermez. Ikinjisi, farklı birnäçe milletler üçin seçmek ayrılýar, olaryň arasyndaky baglyklary görmeýändir. Üçünji, soragy gurluşy daşarydaky bilim üçin baglanýar we ýüzlerçe birnäçe taýdan pikirlere uygulamak kyn. Olar bilen çözmek üçin, biz Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN) teklip berýäris. Bu dünýädçe we öwrenibil örnek soraglary bir sözleden parallel bir şekilde çykmak üçin gurlaýar. Her örnek soragy bir zady öňdýär we ähli örnek soraglary hemişe süýtgedip, ähli soraglary parallel bilen sorap bileris. Daşarydaky bilimden inşa edilen ýerine, örnek soraglar öwrenmek wagtynda öz farklı soraglaryny öwredip biler. Modeli okuw etmek üçin, etiket takmynasyny bir-birden köp Linear Assignasy Mesele (LAP) diýip dynamik bilen altyn takmynasyny iň az zady bilen soraglary bejerýäris. Nejer ýagdaýynda we ýene ýagdaýynda hasaplanýan tejribeler hem görkezilýän çykyşlarymyz öňki sanat nusgalarynyň üstüne çykarýandygyny görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Utambulisho wa entity (NER) ni kazi ya msingi katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Kazi za hivi karibuni hutumia kutambuliwa kwa entity kama kazi ya kusoma, kujenga maswali maalum kwa manufaa ili kutengeneza vifaa. Uchaguzi huu unaumia katika masuala matatu. Kwanza, maswali ya aina maalum yanaweza kutengeneza aina moja tu ya vitu kwa ugonjwa, ambayo haitoshi. Pili, kuchaguliwa kwa aina tofauti za vitu vinavyoonekana, na kusahau kutegemea kati yao. Tatu, ujenzi wa kuuliza unategemea maarifa ya nje na ni vigumu kutumia matukio ya ukweli na mamia ya aina ya viwanda. Ili kuwasiliana nao, tunapendekeza Mtandao wa Mambo ya Kibunge (PIQN), ambao unatengeneza maswali ya mambo ya duniani na yanayojifunza ili kutengeneza vifaa vinavyofanana na hukumu. Kila mfano utafiti unatabiri entity moja, na kwa kulisha maswali yote kwa wakati mmoja, tunaweza kuuliza vitu vyote vinavyofanana. Instead of being constructed from external knowledge, instance queries can learn their different query semantics during training.  Kwa kufundisha muundo huo, tunatumia jukumu la alama kama tatizo la misaada ya Linear moja hadi nyingi (LAP) na kutengeneza vifaa vya dhahabu kwa mfano kwa gharama ndogo ya kazi. Majaribio kwenye seti za taarifa za NER zinaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa zinafanya mifano ya hali iliyopita ya sanaa.', 'af': "Genaamde entiteit herken (NER) is 'n fundamentele taak in natuurlike taal verwerking. Onlangse werke behandel genaamde entiteit herkening as 'n lees verstaan opdrag, konstrukteer tipe spesifieke vraagte hand om entiteite te uitpak. Hierdie paradigme lyf van drie probleem. Eerste, tipe spesifieke vraagte kan slegs een tipe entiteite per inferensie uitpak, wat is oneffisief. Tweede, die uitpakking vir verskillende tipes van entiteite is isolateer, wat die afhanklikhede tussen hulle ignoreer. Trede, navraag konstruksie verlig op eksterne kennis en is moeilik om op realistiese scenarios te wend met honderd van entiteite tipes. Om hulle te behandel, voorstel ons Parallel Instans Navraag Netwerk (PIQN), wat stel globale en leerbare voorbeeld navraag op om entiteite uit 'n seting in 'n parallele manier uit te pak. Elke voorbeeld navraag voorskou een entiteit, en deur alle voorbeeld navraag te voer simultaan, kan ons navraag alle entiteite in parallele. In plaas van eksterne kennis gebou word, kan voorbeeld vraagte hul verskillende navraag semantieke leer tydens onderwerp. Vir die onderwerp van die model, behandel ons etiket toewysing as 'n een- na- veel Linear toewysing Probleem (LAP) en dinamies toewys goud entiteite na voorbeeld vrae met minimale toewysing koste. Eksperimente op beide neste en platte NER-datastelle bevestig dat ons voorgestelde metode voortgaan die vorige state-of-the-art-modelles uitvoer.", 'am': 'የአካባቢው ስህተት ማውቀት (NER) በአዳባዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል መሠረት ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ ይሄ ፍላጎት ከሦስት ጉዳይ ነው:: First, type-specific queries can only extract one type of entities per inference, which is inefficient.  ሁለተኛ፣ ለልዩ ዓይነቶች የተለየ ምርጫው የተለየ ነው፣ የመካከላቸውም የታመነ ነው፡፡ ሦስተኛ፣ የግንኙነቱ ግንኙነት ውጭ እውቀት ላይ ይደገፋል፣ የመቶዎች አካባቢ ዓይነቶች በመቀላቀል ይችላል፡፡ ከእነርሱ ጋር ለመቀበል፣ የፓርላል የድምፅ ጥያቄ መረብ (PIQN) እናሳልቃለን፡፡ ሁሉንም ምሳሌ አንድን አካባቢ ለመጠየቅ እና ሁሉንም ምሳሌዎች በመጠቀም እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ ውጭ እውቀት ካደረጉት ፋንታ፣ ምሳሌ ምርጫዎች በተማሩት ጊዜ ልዩ የጥያቄውን ስምናን ይማራሉ፡፡ ለምሳሌው ለማስተምር፣ የlabel አቀማመጥን ለአንድ ለብዙ የመረጃ አቀማመጥ ችግር (LAP) እና የወርቅ አካላትን ለጥያቄ ጥያቄ በሚያሳየው ውጤቶች ለመግለጫ ጥያቄ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በጭብጥ እና የNER ዳታ-ሰርተቶች ላይ ፈተናዎች የቀድሞውን የ-የ-አርእስት ዓይነታችንን አካባቢ ሥርዓት መተላለፊያውን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'Named entity recognition (NER) is a fundamental task in natural language processing.  সাম্প্রতিক কাজের নামের বস্তুর স্বীকৃতি স্বীকৃতি হিসেবে পাঠ করা হবে, বস্তুগুলো বের করার জন্য নিজেদের নির্মাণ করা হচ এই প্যারাডিম তিনটি বিষয় থেকে কষ্ট পেয়েছে। প্রথমে, টাইপ-নির্দিষ্ট প্রশ্ন কেবল এক ধরনের বস্তুকে বের করে আনতে পারে, যা অনুপস্থিত। দ্বিতীয়, বিভিন্ন ধরনের বস্তুর জন্য নির্বাচন বিচ্ছিন্ন, তাদের মধ্যে নির্ভর করা হচ্ছে। তৃতীয়, বাইরের জ্ঞানের উপর নির্ভর করে নির্মাণ করা অনুসন্ধান করা এবং বাস্তবতার সাথে শত শত বস্তুর ধরনের বাস্তবতা প্রয়োগ করার জন তাদের সাথে চুক্তি করার জন্য আমরা প্যারালেল ইন্সটেনস্ট্রেন্স প্রশ্ন নেটওয়ার্ক (পিকিউএন) প্রস্তাব করি, যা বিশ্বব্যাপী এবং শিক্ষিত অনুসারে  প্রত্যেকটি উদাহরণ অনুসন্ধান করে একটি বস্তু ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে এবং সকল ইনসেন্ট অনুসন্ধানের মাধ্যমে একই সাথে আমরা সকল বস্তুকে প্রশ্ন করতে প বাইরের জ্ঞান থেকে নির্মাণ করার পরিবর্তে উদাহরণস্বরূপ প্রশিক্ষণের সময় তাদের বিভিন্ন অনুসন্ধান শিখতে পারে। মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য আমরা লেবেলের দায়িত্ব নিয়ে এক-থেকে অনেক লাইনের অ্যাসিজেমেন্ট সমস্যা হিসেবে চিকিৎসা করি এবং স্বর্ণের বিষয়গুলোকে নিম প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি পূর্বের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প মডেলের প্রতিষ্ঠানের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে।', 'sq': 'Njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER) është një detyrë thelbësore në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Punët e fundit trajtojnë njohjen e emëruar të njësisë si një detyrë të kuptimit të leximit, duke ndërtuar pyetje specifike për lloj manualisht për të nxjerrë njësitë. Ky paradigm vuan nga tre çështje. Së pari, pyetjet specifike për lloj mund të nxjerrin vetëm një lloj njësive për inferencë, e cila është jo efektive. Së dyti, nxjerrja për lloje të ndryshme njësive është e izoluar, duke injoruar varësitë midis tyre. Së treti, ndërtimi i pyetjeve mbështetet në njohuritë e jashtme dhe është i vështirë të aplikohet në skenarë realiste me qindra lloje njësie. Për të trajtuar ata, ne propozojmë Rrjetin e Kërkimeve të Instancës Paralele (PIQN), i cili krijon kërkime globale dhe të mësueshme për të nxjerrë njësitë nga një fjalim në mënyrë paralele. Çdo pyetje në rast parashikon një njësi, dhe duke ushqyer të gjitha pyetjet në të njëjtën kohë, ne mund të pyesim të gjitha njësitë në paralel. Instead of being constructed from external knowledge, instance queries can learn their different query semantics during training.  Për trajnimin e modelit, ne trajtojmë caktimin e etiketës si një-në-shumë probleme të caktimit linear (LAP) dhe dinamikisht caktojmë njësi ari për të shembulluar pyetje me kosto minimale të caktimit. Eksperimentet në të dy grupet e të dhënave të NER-së të folura dhe të pjatta demonstrojnë se metoda jonë e propozuar është më e lartë se modelet e mëparshme të moderne.', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) je osnovni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Skorašnji rad smatra priznanjem entiteta imenom kao zadatak razumijevanja čitanja, izgradnjom specifičnih pitanja tipa ručno za izvlačenje entiteta. Ova paradigma pati od tri problema. Prvo, specifične ispitivanja tipa mogu izvući samo jednu vrstu entiteta po infekciji, što je neučinjeno. Drugo, ekstrakcija za različite vrste entiteta je izolovana, ignorirajući ovisnosti između njih. Treće, izgradnja pitanja oslanja se na vanjske znanje i teško je primjenjivati na realističke scenarije sa stotinama vrsta entiteta. Da bi se riješili s njima, predlažemo Parallelnu Instance Query Network (PIQN), koja postavlja globalne i učenje primjerice pitanja za izvlačenje entiteta iz rečenice na paralelni način. Svaki primer pitanje predviđa jednu entitetu, a hraneći sve instance pitanja istovremeno, možemo ispitati sve entitate paralelno. Umjesto da se izgradi iz vanjskih znanja, ispitivanja na primjer mogu naučiti različite ispitivanje semantike tijekom treninga. Za obuku model a, smatramo dodatkom etiketa kao problem s jednim na mnogim linijskim dodatkom (LAP) i dinamički dodajemo zlatnim entitetima na primer pitanja sa minimalnim troškovima zadataka. Eksperimenti na nestalim i ravnim podacima NER pokazuju da naša predložena metoda iznosi prethodne modele umjetnosti.', 'ca': "El reconeixement de l'entitat anomenada (NER) és una tasca fonamental en el processament natural de llenguatges. Les obres recents tracten el reconeixement de l'entitat anomenada com una tasca de comprensió de lectura, construint preguntes específices per tipus manualment per extrair entitats. Aquest paradigma pateix tres problemes. En primer lloc, les preguntes específices només poden extrair un tipus d'entitats per inferència, que és ineficient. Segon, l'extracció per diferents tipus d'entitats està aïllada, ignorant les dependencies entre elles. En tercer lloc, la construcció de preguntes es basa en coneixements externs i és difícil aplicar-se a escenaris realistes amb centenars de tipus d'entitats. Per tractar-los, proposem una Rede de Consultes de Instancia Parallel (PIQN), que crea consultas globals i aprendibles per extrair entitats d'una frase de manera parallel a. Cada pregunta de cas prediu una entitat, i alimentant totes les preguntes simultàneament, podem preguntar totes les entitats en paral·lel. En comptes de ser construïts a partir del coneixement extern, les preguntes d'exemple poden aprendre la seva diferent senàntica de preguntes durant l'entrenament. For training the model, we treat label assignment as a one-to-many Linear Assignment Problem (LAP) and dynamically assign gold entities to instance queries with minimal assignment cost.  Els experiments en conjunts de dades NER ninjats i plats demostren que el nostre mètode proposat supera els models més avançats anteriors.", 'az': 'Adlı entitə tanıması (NER) təbiətli dil işləməsində fundamental bir işdir. Son işlər adlı bir entitə tanımasını oxumaq məqsədi olaraq, növ məqsədilərini əlində əlavə çıxartmaq üçün qurular. Bu paradigm üç məsələdən çəkilir. Əvvəlcə, tür müəyyən soruşmaları yalnız bir növ istifadə edə bilər, ki bu yetersiz bir növ istifadə edir. İkincisi, müxtəlif növlərin tərzlərinə çıxarılması, onların arasındakı bağlılıqları dərk etməkdir. Üçüncüsü, quraq inşaatı dış bilgi üzərində təvəkkül edir və yüzlərcə növ növləri ilə istifadə etmək çətindir. Onlarla mübahisə etmək üçün Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN) təklif edirik. Bu, qlobal və öyrənebilir nümunələri bir cümlədən istifadə etmək üçün bir cümlədən istifadə edir. Hər məsəl soruşması bir entitə təmin edir və bütün məsəl soruşmalarını bir-birinə təmin edirək, bütün məsələləri parallel olaraq soruşa bilərik. Dərzində elmdən inşa edilmək yerinə, məsəl soruşmaları təhsil sırasında müxtəlif soruşma semantiklərini öyrənə bilər. Modeli təhsil etmək üçün etiketli təhsil etməyi bir-çox Linear Assignment Problemi (LAP) olaraq təhsil edirik və dinamik olaraq altın təhsil məqsədilə minimal qiymətlə soruşmaq məqsədilə təhsil edirik. Nəzir və düz NER veri qurularında olan təcrübələr təcrübə etdiyimiz metodumun əvvəlki sanatın modellərini təqdim edir.', 'hy': 'Նվանված անհատների ճանաչման (ՆԵՌ) հիմնական խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերամշակում: Վերջին աշխատանքները վերաբերում են անվանված էության ճանաչելուն որպես ընթերցման ընկալումների խնդիր, կառուցում են տիպ-հատուկ հարցեր ձեռքով էության հանելու համար: Այս պարադիգմանը տառապում է երեք խնդիրներից: Առաջինը, տեսակի կոնկրետ հարցերը կարող են միայն մեկ տեսակ միավորներ ստանալ յուրաքանչյուր եզրակացություն, ինչը արդյունավետ չէ: Երկրորդ, տարբեր տեսակի միավորների վերացումը մեկուսացված է, անտեսելով դրանց միջև կախվածությունը: Երրորդ, հարցերի կառուցվածքը հիմնված է արտաքին գիտելիքների վրա և դժվար է կիրառել իրական սցենարներին հարյուրավոր էակների տեսակների հետ: To deal with them, we propose Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), which sets up global and learnable instance queries to extract entities from a sentence in a parallel manner.  Յուրաքանչյուր օրինակ հարցում կանխագուշակում է մեկ էակ, և բոլոր օրինակների հարցումները միաժամանակ կերակրելով, մենք կարող ենք հարցնել բոլոր էակները զուգահեռ: Արտաքին գիտելիքներից կառուցված լինելու փոխարեն, օրինակ հարցերը կարող են սովորել իրենց տարբեր հարցերի սեմանտիկան վարժման ընթացքում: Մոդելի ուսուցման համար մենք վերաբերում ենք պիտակների նվիրվածությունը որպես գծային նվիրվածության խնդիր (LAP) և դինամիկ կերպ նվիրվածում ենք ոսկու կազմակերպություններին, օրինակ, որոնք նվազագույն նվիրվածության արժեքը ունեն: Նեռված և հարթ տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մեթոդը գերազանցում է նախկին բարձրագույն մոդելներին:', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER) je základním úkolem ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Nedávné práce považují rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit za úlohu porozumění čtení, vytvářejí typově specifické dotazy ručně pro extrakci entit. Toto paradigma trpí třemi problémy. Za prvé, typově specifické dotazy mohou extrahovat pouze jeden typ entit na závěr, což je neefektivní. Za druhé, extrakce pro různé typy entit je izolována, ignoruje závislosti mezi nimi. Za třetí, konstrukce dotazů spoléhá na externí znalosti a je obtížné aplikovat na realistické scénáře se stovkami typů entit. Pro jejich řešení navrhujeme Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), která nastavuje globální a učitelné instanční dotazy pro paralelní extrakci entit z věty. Každý instanční dotaz předpovídá jednu entitu a tím, že všechny instanční dotazy naplňujeme současně, můžeme dotazovat všechny entity paralelně. Místo toho, aby byly konstruovány z externích znalostí, instanční dotazy se mohou naučit svou různou dotazovou sémantiku během školení. Pro školení modelu považujeme přiřazení štítků za jeden-k-mnoho problém lineárního přiřazení (LAP) a dynamicky přiřazujeme zlaté entity k instančním dotazům s minimálními náklady na přiřazení. Experimenty na vnořených i plochých datových sadách NER ukazují, že naše navrhovaná metoda překonává předchozí nejmodernější modely.', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tunnustamine (NER) on looduskeele töötlemise põhiülesanne. Hiljutised tööd käsitlevad nimetatud olemi tuvastamist lugemise arusaamise ülesandena, luues käsitsi tüübispetsiifiliseid päringuid olemite ekstraheerimiseks. Sellel paradigmal on kolm probleemi. Esiteks saavad tüübispetsiifilised päringud iga järelduse kohta eraldada ainult ühte tüüpi olemeid, mis on ebatõhus. Teiseks on erinevat tüüpi üksuste ekstraheerimine isoleeritud, ignoreerides nende vahelisi sõltuvusi. Kolmandaks tugineb päringute konstrueerimine välisele teadmisele ja seda on raske rakendada realistlikele stsenaariumidele, kus on sadu olemitüüpe. Nende lahendamiseks pakume välja paralleelse eksemplari päringuvõrgustiku (PIQN), mis loob globaalsed ja õppitavad eksemplari päringud, et ekstraheerida olemeid lausest paralleelselt. Iga eksemplari päring prognoosib ühe olemi ja kõik eksemplari päringud üheaegselt sisestades saame kõiki olemeid paralleelselt pärida. Välistest teadmistest loomise asemel saavad eksemplari päringud õppida koolituse käigus oma erinevat päringu semantikat. Mudeli koolitamiseks käsitleme sildi määramist ühe-mitmele lineaarse määramise probleemina (LAP) ja määrame dünaamiliselt kuldseid olemeid eksemplari päringutele minimaalse määramiskuludega. Katsed nii pesastatud kui ka lamedate NER-andmekogumitega näitavad, et meie pakutud meetod ületab varasemaid tipptasemel mudeleid.', 'fi': 'Nimetty entiteetti tunnistus (NER) on keskeinen tehtävä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Viimeaikaiset teokset käsittelevät nimettyä entiteettitunnistusta lukutaidon ymmärtämiseen liittyvänä tehtävänä, joka rakentaa tyyppikohtaisia kyselyjä manuaalisesti entiteettien purkamiseksi. Tämä paradigma kärsii kolmesta asiasta. Ensinnäkin tyyppikohtaiset kyselyt voivat poimia vain yhden tyyppisiä entiteettejä jokaista päätelmää kohti, mikä on tehotonta. Toiseksi erityyppisten entiteettien uuttaminen on eristetty, jättäen huomiotta niiden väliset riippuvuudet. Kolmanneksi kyselyjen rakentaminen perustuu ulkoiseen tietoon ja sitä on vaikea soveltaa realistisiin skenaarioihin, joissa on satoja kokonaisuustyyppejä. Niiden käsittelemiseksi ehdotamme Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN) -verkostoa, joka määrittää globaalit ja opittavat instanssikyselyt, joiden avulla voidaan purkaa entiteettejä lauseesta rinnakkain. Jokainen esiintymäkysely ennustaa yhden entiteetin, ja syöttämällä kaikki esiintymäkyselyt samanaikaisesti voimme kysellä kaikki entiteetit rinnakkain. Sen sijaan, että ne olisi rakennettu ulkoisesta tiedosta, instanssikyselyt voivat oppia erilaisia kyselysemantiikkansa koulutuksen aikana. Mallin koulutusta varten käsittelemme tunnisteiden määrittämistä lineaarisena määritysongelmana (LAP) ja määritämme dynaamisesti kultaisia entiteettejä esiintymäkyselyille mahdollisimman pienin määrityskustannuksin. Sekä sisäkkäisillä että tasaisilla NER-tietoaineistoilla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä ylittää aiemmat huipputekniset mallit.', 'jv': 'name tab-style Paratidik iki sak sawetara tanggal telu kesempatan. susahe Pak-Pak, kelas kanggo Kemerdekaan karo akeh sing sampeyan nêmêr Genjer-Genjer Tulung nggo nganggo cara-cara, kita supoyo Paralll Instance query Network Sample query Tanian olèh pawartos nggawe nang ngerwih rabi, sampek, dadi kapan kanggo ngerti seneng langgambar barang sampek. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness layer-mode-effects', 'ha': "Sunan sunan sunan shaidar abun (NER) shi ne wani aikin muhimmi a cikin aikin aiki na fassarar harshen. Yin aikin da ake ƙara zasu sunan sunan shaidar abun kamar wani aikin lissafi na karantawa, mai ƙin shiryoyin abun-ƙayyade zuwa masu fitarwa da hannun. Wannan paradigm yana da matabbata uku. Na farko, zaɓen tambayi-nau'in-nau'i masu ƙayyade, za'a iya fitar da nau'i guda ko wani sura, da kuma bã ya kasa ba. Piki, ana rarraba wa nau'i-nau'in abubuwa daban, ana ƙyale masu baka tsakaninsu. Third, query construction relies on external knowledge and is difficult to apply to realistic scenarios with hundreds of entity types.  Dõmin ka yi musu shari'a, Munã buɗa Cikakken Ismala'in Parallel (PIQN), wanda ke daidaita wasu maswali na zama masu sanawa na duniya da kwamfyuta don ya fitar masu abun daga birnin da ke daidaita. Kowace misali na gabatar da jigon kima guda, kuma da abincin duk maswali na misali sami ɗaya, za'a iya tambayi duk abubuwa a daidaita. Babu samun an ƙiƙira shi daga ilmi na baka, masu tambayar misali za'a iya fahimtar mutane masu daban-tambayar a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da su. Ko yin amfani da shirin ayuka, za'a yi amfani da misalin alama kamar wata masĩfa mai ƙaranci ga linje (LoP) da kuma za'a raba abubuwa na zĩnãriya a kanana tsakanin ayuka, kamar misali masu amfani da nau'in aiki da ƙarami. Tajararin da aka samar da su both nested and flat NER dataset sun nuna cewa shirin ayukanmu da aka buƙata ta samun motel na-zaman-state-of-the-art.", 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER) je temeljna naloga pri obdelavi naravnega jezika. Nedavna dela obravnavajo prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet kot opravilo razumevanja branja, pri čemer ročno ustvarjajo poizvedbe za določene vrste za izvlečanje entitet. Ta paradigma trpi zaradi treh vprašanj. Prvič, poizvedbe za posamezno vrsto lahko izvlečejo samo eno vrsto entitet na sklep, kar je neučinkovito. Drugič, ekstrakcija za različne vrste entitet je izolirana, pri čemer ne upošteva odvisnosti med njimi. Tretjič, konstrukcija poizvedb temelji na zunanjem znanju in jo je težko uporabiti za realistične scenarije s stotinami vrst entitet. Za obravnavo njih predlagamo omrežje vzporednih poizvedb primerkov (PIQN), ki vzpostavlja globalne in učljive poizvedbe primerkov za vzporedno ekstrakcijo entitet iz stavka. Vsaka poizvedba primerkov napoveduje eno entiteto in s hkratnim podajanjem vseh poizvedb primerkov lahko poizvedbamo vse entitete vzporedno. Namesto da bi bile izdelane iz zunanjega znanja, se poizvedbe primerkov lahko med usposabljanjem naučijo različne semantike poizvedb. Za usposabljanje modela dodeljevanje oznak obravnavamo kot problem linearnega dodeljevanja enega proti več in dinamično dodeljujemo zlate entitete poizvedbam primerkov z minimalnimi stroški dodeljevanja. Eksperimenti na gnezdenih in ravnih naborih podatkov NER kažejo, da naša predlagana metoda presega prejšnje najsodobnejše modele.', 'he': 'זיהוי ישות בשם (NER) הוא משימה בסיסית בעבודת שפת טבעית. Recent works treat named entity recognition as a reading comprehension task, constructing type-specific queries manually to extract entities.  הפרדיגמה הזו סובלת משלושה בעיות. ראשית, שאלות מסוימות לסוג יכולות להוציא רק סוג אחד של ישויות לכל תוצאה, שזה לא יעיל. שנית, החולץ לסוגים שונים של יחידות מבודד, מתעלם מהתלויות ביניהם. שלישית, בניית חקירות תלויה בידע חיצוני וקשה להתייחס לתסריטים מציאותיים עם מאות סוגי ישויות. כדי להתמודד איתם, אנו מציעים רשת ביקור במקרה פעמונית (PIQN), שמכינה ביקור דוגמאי גלובלי וללמד כדי להוציא יחידות משפט באופן קבוע. כל ביקור דוגמא חושף ישות אחת, וכך שנאכיל את כל ביקורי דוגמא באותו הזמן, נוכל לבקש את כל היחידות במקביל. במקום להיות בנוי מידע חיצוני, שאלות דוגמאות יכולות ללמוד סמנטיקה השונית של שאלות במהלך האימון. על מנת לאמן את המודל, אנו מתייחסים למשימה של תווית כבעיה של שימוש קוני אחד-להרבה (LAP) ודינמיקלית משימים יחידות זהב לדוגמא בקשות עם עלות שימוש מינימלית. ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים של NER הקן ושטוחים מראים שהשיטה המוצעת שלנו עולה על מודלים חדשים קודמים.', 'bo': 'མིང་བཏགས་པའི་དབུལ་རིགས་རྟོགས(NER)ནི་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་ལ་རྨན་གཞི་བ་ཞིག་རེད། འཕྲལ་གསོག་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཆ་རྣམས་ལྟ་ཀློག་པའི་འཇུག་སྣོད་བཞིན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ། མི་རྒྱུན་ལམ་འདི་དཀའ་ངལ་གསུམ་རེད། དང་པོ་ནས་དབྱེ་བ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་དག་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་རུང་མེད་པའི་རིགས་རྣམས་གཅིག་ལས་བཅུག་ནུས། གཉིས་པ་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན། དབྱིབས་དབྱེ་བ་མི་འདྲ་བར་བསྡད་པ་ལས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་རྣམས་མེད་ཀྱི་རེད། Third, query construction relies on external knowledge and is difficult to apply to realistic scenarios with hundreds of entity types. To deal with them, we propose Parallel Instance Query Network (PIQN), which sets up global and learnable instance queries to extract entities from a sentence in a parallel manner. དཔེ་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་ཚང་མཉམ་དུ་དབུས་གཅིག་དང་། དཔེ་དབུས་ཀྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་ཚང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དཔེར་ན། དྲི་ཚིག་མང་ཙམ་ཤེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་གཞི་བཙུགས་ལས་བཟོ་བཅུག་མི་འདུག དེ་ལྟ་བུ་ཤེས་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། For training the model, we treat label assignment as a one-to-many Linear Assignment Problem (LAP) and dynamically assign gold entities to instance queries with minimal assignment cost. Experiments on both nested and flat NER datasets demonstrate that our proposed method outperforms previous state-of-the-art models.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'ProphetChat: تعزيز توليد الحوار مع محاكاة المحادثة المستقبلية', 'es': 'ProphetChat: Mejorando la generación de diálogos con la simulación de conversaciones futuras', 'pt': 'ProphetChat: aprimorando a geração de diálogos com simulação de conversas futuras', 'fr': 'ProphetChat\xa0: améliorer la génération de dialogues grâce à la simulation de conversations futures', 'ja': 'ProphetChat ：将来の会話のシミュレーションで対話の生成を強化する', 'zh': '先知聊天:模拟未来对话', 'hi': 'पैगंबरचैट: भविष्य की बातचीत के सिमुलेशन के साथ संवाद पीढ़ी को बढ़ाना', 'ru': 'ProphetChat: Улучшение генерации диалога с симуляцией будущего разговора', 'ga': 'ProphetChat: Giniúint Idirphlé a Fheabhsú le Insamhladh ar Chomhrá sa Todhchaí', 'ka': 'პროგექტის ფარატი: დიალოგის შექმნა სიმულაცია მომავალე პარამეტრების სიმულაციაზე', 'hu': 'ProphetChat: A párbeszéd generálásának javítása a jövőbeli beszélgetések szimulációjával', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση της δημιουργίας διαλόγου με προσομοίωση της μελλοντικής συνομιλίας', 'it': 'ProphetChat: Migliorare la generazione del dialogo con la simulazione della conversazione futura', 'mk': 'ProphetChat: подобрување на генерацијата на дијалог со симулација на идна конверзација', 'lt': 'ProphetChat: dialogo kūrimo stiprinimas simuliuojant būsimą konversaciją', 'kk': 'Пайғамбар сұхбат: Болашақ сұхбат симуляциясы бойынша диалогты құру', 'mn': 'Пайгамбарт: Ирээдүйн ярилцлагын Simulation of Conversation', 'ms': 'ProphetChat: meningkatkan Jenerasi Dialog dengan Simulasi Perbualan Masa Hadapan', 'mt': 'ProphetChat: Titjib fil-Ġenerazzjoni tad-Djalogu bis-Simulazzjoni ta’ Konverżjoni fil-Futur', 'no': 'Profesprat: Forstørrar dialoggenerering med simulering av framtidige samtale', 'pl': 'ProphetChat: Wzmacnianie generowania dialogu dzięki symulacji przyszłych rozmów', 'ro': 'ProphetChat: Îmbunătățirea generației dialogului cu simularea conversațiilor viitoare', 'sr': 'Proročanstvo: Povećavanje generacije dijaloga sa Simulacijom budućeg razgovora', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න කතාව: අනාගතය සම්බන්ධය සමග සංවාදය සංවාදය වැඩි කරනවා', 'so': 'Property Chat: Horizontal Generation with simulation of Future conversation', 'ml': 'പ്രൊഫസ്റ്റ് ചാറ്റ്: ഭാവി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സിമുലേഷനുമായി ഡയലോഗ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു', 'sv': 'ProphetChat: Förbättra dialoggenerering med simulering av framtida konversationer', 'ta': 'புதிய உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்தை அடுத்த உரையாடல் பாவனைப்பாட்டுடன் மேம்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'پیغمبر کی بات: آینده بات کی سیمولیسی کے ساتھ دائیلوگ پیدا کرنے والی', 'vi': 'Công cụ: Tăng cường Thế hệ đối thoại với mô phỏng tương lai', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'bg': 'Повишаване на генерирането на диалог със симулация на бъдещ разговор', 'da': 'ProphetChat: Forbedring af dialoggenerering med simulering af fremtidige samtaler', 'nl': 'ProphetChat: Het genereren van dialoog verbeteren met simulatie van toekomstige gesprekken', 'hr': 'Prorok Chat: Povećavanje generacije dijaloga sa simulacijom budućeg razgovora', 'de': 'ProphetChat: Verbesserung der Dialoggenerierung durch Simulation zukünftiger Gespräche', 'id': 'ProphetChat: Enhancing Dialogue Generation with Simulation of Future Conversation', 'ko': 'ProphetChat: 미래 대화를 모의하여 대화를 강화하여 생성', 'fa': 'پیامبر: افزایش نسل دیalog با شبیه\u200cسازی گفتگوی آینده', 'tr': 'Meslektçe: Gelecek Qonuşma bilen bejermek Dialog Jemi', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo: Kuboresha Uzalishaji wa Dialogu kwa Simulation of Conversations Future', 'sq': 'ProphetChat: Përmirësimi i gjenerimit të dialogut me Simulimin e Bisedës së ardhshme', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'az': 'Peyğəmbər Söhbəti: Geləcək Söhbətlərin Simülasyonu ilə Dialog nəslini artırmaq', 'bn': 'Property Chat: ভবিষ্যতের কথোপকথন সিমুলেশনের সাথে ডায়ালগ জেনারেশন বৃদ্ধি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Prorok Chat: Povećavanje generacije dijaloga sa simulacijom budućeg razgovora', 'ca': 'ProphetChat: millorar la generació de diàleg amb la simulació de la conversa futura', 'cs': 'ProphetChat: zlepšení generování dialogu pomocí simulace budoucí konverzace', 'af': 'Profeetspraak: Verbeter Dialoog Generasie met Simulasie van Toekomstige Gespraak', 'et': 'ProphetChat: dialoogi loomise tõhustamine tulevase vestluse simulatsiooniga', 'fi': 'ProphetChat: Vuoropuhelun luomisen tehostaminen tulevaisuuden keskustelun simuloinnilla', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'ProphetChat: Izboljšanje ustvarjanja dialoga s simulacijo prihodnjega pogovora', 'jv': 'Proyek Dialog: Gak nggoleki Dialog Generasi karo Simulasi kanggo Kebebasan Perintah', 'ha': 'Chat: Farawa ga Lakewa na Dialog da Simulan na Faso', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གླེང་མོལ་དང་མ་འོངས་བའི་གཏམ་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་Simulation'}
{'en': 'In the field of sentiment analysis, several studies have highlighted that a single sentence may express multiple, sometimes contrasting, sentiments and emotions, each with its own experiencer, target and/or cause. To this end, over the past few years researchers have started to collect and annotate data manually, in order to investigate the capabilities of automatic systems not only to distinguish between emotions, but also to capture their semantic constituents. However, currently available gold datasets are heterogeneous in size, domain, format, splits, emotion categories and role labels, making comparisons across different works difficult and hampering progress in the area. In this paper, we tackle this issue and present a unified evaluation framework focused on Semantic Role Labeling for Emotions (SRL4E), in which we unify several datasets tagged with emotions and semantic roles by using a common labeling scheme. We use SRL4E as a benchmark to evaluate how modern pretrained language models perform and analyze where we currently stand in this task, hoping to provide the tools to facilitate studies in this complex area.', 'ar': 'تستخدم نماذج الحوار التوليدية النموذجية تاريخ الحوار لتوليد الاستجابة. ومع ذلك ، نظرًا لأنه يمكن في كثير من الأحيان الرد على كلام حوار واحد بشكل مناسب من خلال ردود مختلفة متعددة ، فإن إنشاء استجابة مرغوبة تستند فقط إلى المعلومات التاريخية ليس بالأمر السهل. حدسيًا ، إذا كان روبوت المحادثة يستطيع التنبؤ مسبقًا بما سيتحدث عنه المستخدم (أي مستقبل الحوار) بعد تلقي رده ، فقد يقدم استجابة أكثر إفادة. وفقًا لذلك ، نقترح إطارًا جديدًا لتوليد الحوار باسم ProphetChat والذي يستخدم مستقبل الحوار المحاكي في مرحلة الاستدلال لتعزيز توليد الاستجابة. لتمكين روبوت المحادثة من التنبؤ بمستقبل الحوار ، نقوم بتصميم إستراتيجية نشر تشبه البحث عن الحزمة لمحاكاة الحوار المستقبلية باستخدام نموذج إنشاء حوار نموذجي ومحدد حوار. باستخدام العقود الآجلة المحاكية ، نستخدم بعد ذلك مجموعة من مولد التاريخ للاستجابة ومولد المستقبل للاستجابة لتوليد استجابة أكثر إفادة بشكل مشترك. تُظهر التجارب التي أجريت على مجموعتي بيانات شائعتين لحوار المجال المفتوح أن ProphetChat يمكن أن يولد ردودًا أفضل على الخطوط الأساسية القوية ، مما يؤكد مزايا دمج مستقبل الحوار المحاكي.', 'es': 'Los modelos típicos de diálogo generativo utilizan el historial de diálogo para generar la respuesta. Sin embargo, dado que un enunciado de diálogo a menudo puede responderse adecuadamente con múltiples respuestas distintas, generar una respuesta deseada basada únicamente en la información histórica no es fácil. Intuitivamente, si el chatbot puede prever de antemano de qué hablaría el usuario (es decir, el futuro del diálogo) después de recibir su respuesta, podría proporcionar una respuesta más informativa. En consecuencia, proponemos un marco de generación de diálogo novedoso llamado ProphetChat que utiliza los futuros de diálogo simulado en la fase de inferencia para mejorar la generación de respuestas. Para permitir que el chatbot prevea el futuro del diálogo, diseñamos una estrategia de despliegue similar a la búsqueda de haces para la simulación futura del diálogo utilizando un modelo de generación de diálogo típico y un selector de diálogo. Con los futuros simulados, utilizamos el conjunto de un generador de historial a respuesta y un generador de futuro a respuesta para generar conjuntamente una respuesta más informativa. Los experimentos en dos populares conjuntos de datos de diálogo de dominio abierto demuestran que ProphetChat puede generar mejores respuestas sobre líneas de base sólidas, lo que valida las ventajas de incorporar los futuros de diálogo simulado.', 'pt': 'Os modelos típicos de diálogo generativo utilizam o histórico do diálogo para gerar a resposta. No entanto, uma vez que um enunciado de diálogo muitas vezes pode ser adequadamente respondido por várias respostas distintas, gerar uma resposta desejada apenas com base nas informações históricas não é fácil. Intuitivamente, se o chatbot puder prever com antecedência sobre o que o usuário falaria (ou seja, o futuro do diálogo) após receber sua resposta, ele poderia fornecer uma resposta mais informativa. Assim, propomos uma nova estrutura de geração de diálogo chamada ProphetChat que utiliza os futuros de diálogo simulados na fase de inferência para aprimorar a geração de respostas. Para permitir que o chatbot preveja o futuro do diálogo, projetamos uma estratégia de implementação do tipo busca de feixe para simulação do futuro do diálogo usando um modelo típico de geração de diálogo e um seletor de diálogo. Com os futuros simulados, utilizamos o conjunto de um gerador de histórico para resposta e um gerador de futuro para resposta para gerar conjuntamente uma resposta mais informativa. Experimentos em dois conjuntos de dados populares de diálogo de domínio aberto demonstram que o ProphetChat pode gerar melhores respostas sobre linhas de base fortes, o que valida as vantagens de incorporar os futuros de diálogo simulado.', 'fr': "Les modèles de dialogue génératifs typiques utilisent l'historique des dialogues pour générer la réponse. Cependant, étant donné qu'il est souvent possible de répondre de manière appropriée à un énoncé de dialogue par plusieurs réponses distinctes, il n'est pas facile de générer une réponse souhaitée uniquement sur la base des informations historiques. Intuitivement, si le chatbot peut prévoir à l'avance ce dont l'utilisateur parlera (c'est-à-dire le futur dialogue) après avoir reçu sa réponse, il pourrait éventuellement fournir une réponse plus informative. En conséquence, nous proposons un nouveau cadre de génération de dialogue appelé ProphetChat qui utilise les futurs de dialogue simulés dans la phase d'inférence pour améliorer la génération de réponses. Pour permettre au chatbot de prévoir l'avenir du dialogue, nous concevons une stratégie de déploiement de type recherche de faisceau pour la simulation future du dialogue à l'aide d'un modèle de génération de dialogue typique et d'un sélecteur de dialogue. Avec les futurs simulés, nous utilisons ensuite l'ensemble d'un générateur d'historique de réponse et d'un générateur de réponse future pour générer conjointement une réponse plus informative. Des expériences sur deux ensembles de données de dialogue populaires dans le domaine ouvert démontrent que ProphetChat peut générer de meilleures réponses sur des bases de référence solides, ce qui valide les avantages de l'intégration des futurs de dialogue simulés.", 'ja': '典型的な生成ダイアログモデルは、応答を生成するためにダイアログ履歴を利用します。 しかしながら、１つの対話発話は、しばしば複数の異なる応答によって適切に応答することができるため、履歴情報のみに基づいて所望の応答を生成することは容易ではない。 直感的には、チャットボットが、その応答を受信した後にユーザが何について話すか（すなわち、将来の対話）を事前に予測することができれば、それは、より情報量の多い応答を提供する可能性がある。 そこで、推論フェーズでシミュレートされた対話未来を活用して応答生成を強化するProphetChatという新規の対話生成フレームワークを提案する。 チャットボットが将来の対話を予測できるように、一般的な対話生成モデルと対話セレクタを使用して、将来の対話シミュレーションのためのビームサーチのような展開戦略を設計します。 シミュレートされた未来では、履歴から応答までの生成器と未来から応答までの生成器のアンサンブルを利用して、より情報量の多い応答を共同で生成します。 2つの人気のあるオープンドメイン対話データセットの実験は、ProphetChatが強力なベースラインにわたってより良い応答を生成することができることを示し、これはシミュレートされた対話の未来を組み込む利点を検証します。', 'ru': 'Типичные модели генеративного диалога используют историю диалога для генерирования ответа. Однако, поскольку на одно из высказываний, высказанных в ходе диалога, часто можно дать правильный ответ с помощью множества различных ответов, генерировать желаемый ответ исключительно на основе исторической информации нелегко. Интуитивно, если чат-бот может заранее предвидеть, о чем будет говорить пользователь (т.е. будущее диалога) после получения своего ответа, он, возможно, сможет дать более информативный ответ. Соответственно, мы предлагаем новую структуру генерации диалога под названием ProphetChat, которая использует смоделированное будущее диалога на этапе вывода для улучшения генерации ответа. Чтобы чат-бот мог предвидеть будущее диалога, мы разрабатываем стратегию развертывания, похожую на поиск луча, для будущего моделирования диалога с использованием типовой модели генерации диалога и селектора диалога. С помощью моделируемого будущего мы затем используем ансамбль генератора "история - ответная реакция" и генератора "будущее - ответная реакция" для совместного получения более информативного ответа. Эксперименты с двумя популярными наборами данных открытого диалога показывают, что ProphetChat может генерировать лучшие ответы по сравнению с сильными базовыми линиями, что подтверждает преимущества включения имитируемого будущего диалога.', 'zh': '典刑之生,因历史记录以应之。 然一言多应以应之,故唯应之不易。 直观曰:若机器人应而先见用户将言(未),则更翔实应矣。 故ProphetChat者新型生框架,框架以理拟未来而应之。 所以机器人见未来者,以典刑为选择器,设意于波束搜之策也。 模拟之来,因史以应生成器与未来以应生成器,合而成应。 两行开域数集之实验,ProphetChat可以强基线起善应,此验入拟未来之势也。', 'hi': 'विशिष्ट उत्पादक संवाद मॉडल प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करने के लिए संवाद इतिहास का उपयोग करते हैं। हालांकि, चूंकि एक संवाद उच्चारण को अक्सर कई अलग-अलग प्रतिक्रियाओं द्वारा उचित रूप से उत्तर दिया जा सकता है, इसलिए केवल ऐतिहासिक जानकारी के आधार पर वांछित प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करना आसान नहीं है। Intuitively, अगर चैटबॉट पहले से अनुमान लगा सकता है कि उपयोगकर्ता अपनी प्रतिक्रिया प्राप्त करने के बाद (यानी, संवाद भविष्य) के बारे में क्या बात करेगा, तो यह संभवतः अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण प्रतिक्रिया प्रदान कर सकता है। तदनुसार, हम पैगंबरचैट नामक एक उपन्यास संवाद पीढ़ी के ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी को बढ़ाने के लिए अनुमान चरण में नकली संवाद वायदा का उपयोग करता है। चैटबॉट को संवाद भविष्य की भविष्यवाणी करने में सक्षम बनाने के लिए, हम एक विशिष्ट संवाद पीढ़ी मॉडल और एक संवाद चयनकर्ता का उपयोग करके संवाद भविष्य के सिमुलेशन के लिए एक बीम-खोज जैसी रोल-आउट रणनीति तैयार करते हैं। नकली वायदा के साथ, हम तब एक इतिहास-से-प्रतिक्रिया जनरेटर और संयुक्त रूप से अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करने के लिए भविष्य से प्रतिक्रिया जनरेटर के पहनावे का उपयोग करते हैं। दो लोकप्रिय ओपन-डोमेन संवाद डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि पैगंबरचैट मजबूत बेसलाइन पर बेहतर प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न कर सकता है, जो नकली संवाद वायदा को शामिल करने के फायदों को मान्य करता है।', 'ga': 'Úsáideann gnáthmhúnlaí comhphlé giniúna stair an chomhphlé chun an fhreagairt a ghiniúint. Mar sin féin, ós rud é gur minic gur féidir freagra cuí a thabhairt ar chaint chomhphlé amháin trí fhreagraí éagsúla ar leith, níl sé éasca freagra inmhianaithe a ghiniúint bunaithe ar an eolas stairiúil amháin. Go hintinneach, más féidir leis an chatbot a thuar roimh ré cad a labhródh an t-úsáideoir faoi (i.e. todhchaí an chomhphlé) tar éis dó a fhreagra a fháil, d’fhéadfadh sé freagra níos faisnéiseach a sholáthar. Dá réir sin, molaimid creat giniúna idirphlé úr darb ainm ProphetChat a úsáideann todhchaíochtaí comhphlé insamhlaithe sa chéim tátail chun giniúint freagartha a fheabhsú. Le go mbeidh an chatbot in ann todhchaí an chomhphlé a thuar, déanaimid straitéis rolladh amach cosúil le bhíoma-chuardach a dhearadh le haghaidh ionsamhlúcháin sa todhchaí idirphlé ag baint úsáide as samhail giniúna comhphlé tipiciúil agus roghnóir idirphlé. Leis an todhchaí insamhladh, bainimid úsáid ansin as an ensemble de ghineadóir stair-go-freagra agus gineadóir todhchaí-go-freagra chun freagairt níos eolasaí a ghiniúint i gcomhpháirt. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar dhá thacar sonraí comhphlé fearainn a bhfuil móréilimh orthu gur féidir le ProphetChat freagraí níos fearr a ghiniúint thar bhunlínte láidre, rud a bhailíochtaíonn na buntáistí a bhaineann le todhchaíochtaí comhphlé insamhlaithe a ionchorprú.', 'el': 'Τυπικά μοντέλα γενετήσιου διαλόγου χρησιμοποιούν το ιστορικό διαλόγου για να δημιουργήσουν την απάντηση. Ωστόσο, δεδομένου ότι μια ομιλία διαλόγου μπορεί συχνά να απαντηθεί κατάλληλα με πολλαπλές διακριτές απαντήσεις, η δημιουργία μιας επιθυμητής απάντησης βασισμένης αποκλειστικά στις ιστορικές πληροφορίες δεν είναι εύκολη. Διαισθητικά, αν το ρομπότ μπορεί να προβλέψει εκ των προτέρων για το τι θα μιλούσε ο χρήστης (δηλαδή το μέλλον του διαλόγου) μετά τη λήψη της απάντησής του, θα μπορούσε ενδεχομένως να παράσχει μια πιο ενημερωτική απάντηση. Κατά συνέπεια, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο δημιουργίας διαλόγου που ονομάζεται το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί το προσομοιωμένο μέλλον διαλόγου στη φάση συμπερασμάτων για να ενισχύσει την παραγωγή απόκρισης. Για να επιτρέψουμε στο chatbot να προβλέψει το μέλλον του διαλόγου, σχεδιάζουμε μια στρατηγική ανάπτυξης που μοιάζει με την αναζήτηση δέσμης για μελλοντική προσομοίωση διαλόγου χρησιμοποιώντας ένα τυπικό μοντέλο δημιουργίας διαλόγου και έναν επιλογέα διαλόγου. Με το προσομοιωμένο μέλλον, χρησιμοποιούμε στη συνέχεια το σύνολο μιας γεννήτριας ιστορίας-απόκρισης και μιας γεννήτριας μελλοντικής απόκρισης για να παραγάγουμε από κοινού μια πιο ενημερωτική απάντηση. Τα πειράματα σε δύο δημοφιλή σύνολα δεδομένων διαλόγου ανοικτού τομέα δείχνουν ότι το ProphetChat μπορεί να δημιουργήσει καλύτερες απαντήσεις πάνω από ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης, γεγονός που επικυρώνει τα πλεονεκτήματα της ενσωμάτωσης των προσομοιωμένων μελλοντικών διαλόγων.', 'hu': 'A tipikus generációs párbeszédmodellek a párbeszédelőzményeket használják a válasz generálására. Mivel azonban egy párbeszédbeszédet gyakran több különböző válasz segítségével is megfelelően lehet megválaszolni, a kívánt válasz kizárólag a történelmi információk alapján nem könnyű. Intuitív módon, ha a chatbot előre tudja látni, hogy miről beszélne a felhasználó (azaz a párbeszéd jövőjéről), miután megkapta a választ, akkor esetleg információsabb választ adhat. Ennek megfelelően javasoljuk a ProphetChat nevű új párbeszédgenerációs keretrendszert, amely a következtetési fázisban a szimulált párbeszéd jövőjét használja a válasz generálásának javítása érdekében. Annak érdekében, hogy a chatbot előre tudja látni a párbeszéd jövőjét, egy tipikus párbeszédgenerációs modell és egy párbeszédválasztó segítségével tervezünk egy beam-keresési szerű roll-out stratégiát a párbeszéd jövőbeni szimulációjára. A szimulált jövővel ezután egy történet-válasz generátor és egy jövő-válasz generátor együttesét használjuk fel, hogy közösen generáljunk egy információsabb választ. Két népszerű nyílt tartományú párbeszédadatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a ProphetChat hatékonyabb válaszokat tud generálni az erős alapvető vonalakon, ami igazolja a szimulált párbeszéd jövőjének beépítésének előnyeit.', 'ka': 'ტიპური გენერაციური დიალოგის მოდელები დიალოგის ისტორიის გამოყენება გარეშე. მაგრამ, რადგან ერთი დიალოგის გამოსახულება ძალიან შესაძლებელია, რამდენიმე განსხვავებული განსხვავებული პასუხებით დაუწყება, რომელიც თითქონული პასუხი მხოლოდ ისტორიული ინფორ ინტევიტიურად, თუ ჩატვირთვის წინ შეიძლება წინასწარმოდგინოთ, რას შესაძლებელია მომხმარებელი გამოსახულებელი (მაგალითად დიალოგის მომავალი) განახულების შემდეგ, შეიძლება უფრო ინფ ამიტომ, ჩვენ პროგრამეტური დიალოგის დავიწყება პროგრამეტური ფარტი, რომელიც გამოიყენებს სიმულაციული დიალოგის მომავალეობების შემდეგ ინფრენციის ფაზაში, რომელიც განა დიალოგის მომავალის გახსნა, ჩვენ დიალოგის მომავალის გამოყენება დიალოგის მომავალის და დიალოგის მონიშნელის სტრაქტიფიკაციის გახსნა სტრაქტიფიკაციის გამოყენება. სიმულაციული მომავალთან, შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ინფორმაციური პასუხისთვის და მომავალთან დარესუხისთვის გენერატორის ინფორმაციური პასუხისთვის. ორი პოლიპური დიალოგის დიალოგის დიალოგის შესახებ გამოცდილება, რომ პროგექტი შესაძლებელია უკეთესი პასუხები ძალიან ფესტური ხაზების შესახებ, რომელიც გავაკეთება სიმულაციული დიალ', 'it': "I modelli di dialogo generativi tipici utilizzano la cronologia dei dialoghi per generare la risposta. Tuttavia, dal momento che un discorso di dialogo può spesso essere adeguatamente risposto da più risposte distinte, generare una risposta desiderata basata esclusivamente sulle informazioni storiche non è facile. Intuitivamente, se il chatbot può prevedere in anticipo di cosa parlerebbe l'utente (cioè il futuro dialogo) dopo aver ricevuto la sua risposta, potrebbe eventualmente fornire una risposta più informativa. Di conseguenza, proponiamo un nuovo framework di generazione del dialogo chiamato ProphetChat che utilizza il futuro del dialogo simulato nella fase di inferenza per migliorare la generazione della risposta. Per consentire al chatbot di prevedere il futuro del dialogo, progettiamo una strategia di roll-out simile a una ricerca beam per la simulazione futura del dialogo utilizzando un tipico modello di generazione del dialogo e un selettore di dialogo. Con i futures simulati, utilizziamo quindi l'insieme di un generatore di storia-risposta e di un generatore futuro-risposta per generare congiuntamente una risposta più informativa. Esperimenti su due popolari set di dati di dialogo open-domain dimostrano che ProphetChat può generare risposte migliori su linee di base forti, il che convalida i vantaggi di incorporare i futuri dialoghi simulati.", 'kk': 'Жауап беру үшін диалог тарыхының түрінде құрылған диалог үлгілері қолданылады. Бірақ бір диалог сөйлесу көбінесе бірнеше түрлі жауап беруге болады. Бірақ қалаған жауап жасау тек тарихлық мәліметіне негізделген ғана оңай емес. Егер шат батырмасы алғанда пайдаланушының не сөйлесетінін (т.е. болашақ диалог) көрсетілсе, оның жауабын алғанда бұл көбірек жауап бере алады. Сондықтан, біз Пророфейс Чат атауындағы жаңа диалог құрылғысын ұсындық. Бұл жауап жасау үшін бағытталған диалог болашақтарын қолданады. Диалогты болашақ көрсету үшін, бұл диалогты көрсету үшін, келесі диалогты симуляциялау үшін қалыпты диалог құру үлгісін мен диалогты таңдау үлгісін қолдануға сәйкес келеді. Бұл симулиралды болашақтардан кейін біз тарихтан жауап беру генераторын және болашақ жауап беру генераторын біріктіруге болады. Екі жалпы ашылған домен диалог деректер қорларының тәжірибесі, Пророфейс Чат күшті негізгі сызықтар арқылы жақсы жауап бере алады, бұл симулирацияланған диалог futureларын қосу мүмкіндігін тексеред', 'ms': 'Model dialog generif biasa menggunakan sejarah dialog untuk menghasilkan balasan. Namun, kerana satu ucapan dialog sering dapat dijawab dengan betul dengan berbilang jawapan yang berbeza, menghasilkan jawapan yang diinginkan hanya berdasarkan maklumat sejarah tidak mudah. Secara intuitif, jika chatbot boleh meramalkan secara awal apa yang pengguna akan bercakap tentang (iaitu, masa depan dialog) selepas menerima balasannya, i a mungkin boleh menyediakan balasan yang lebih maklumat. Oleh sebab itu, kami melamar kerangka generasi dialog baru bernama ProphetChat yang menggunakan masa depan dialog simulasi dalam fasa kesimpulan untuk meningkatkan generasi balas. Untuk benarkan chatbot untuk meramalkan masa depan dialog, kami merancang strategi roll-out seperti carian-cahaya untuk simulasi dialog masa depan menggunakan model generasi dialog biasa dan pemilih dialog. With the simulated futures, we then utilize the ensemble of a history-to-response generator and a future-to-response generator to jointly generate a more informative response.  Eksperimen pada dua set data dialog-domain terbuka yang populer menunjukkan bahawa ProphetChat boleh menghasilkan balasan yang lebih baik atas garis dasar yang kuat, yang sahkan keuntungan untuk memasukkan masa depan dialog simulasi.', 'lt': 'Tipiški kartų dialogo modeliai naudoja dialogo istoriją, kad būtų sukurtas atsakas. Vis dėlto, kadangi į vieną dialogo žodį dažnai galima tinkamai atsakyti keliais skirtingais atsakymais, norimo atsakymo sukūrimas tik remiantis istorine informacija nėra lengvas. Intuitively, if the chatbot can foresee in advance what the user would talk about (i.e., the dialogue future) after receiving its response, it could possibly provide a more informative response.  Todėl siūlome naują dialogo kūrimo sistemą, vadinamą ProphetChat, kuri panaudotų modeliuojamą dialogo ateitį išvadų etape reagavimo į šį procesą didinimui. Kad chatbotas galėtų numatyti dialogo ateitį, parengiame į šviesą paieškos būdu panašią dialogo ateities simuliavimo strategiją naudojant tipišką dialogo generacijos model į ir dialogo rinkėją. Simuliuojant ateities perspektyvas, mes kartu naudojame istorijos ir atsako generatoriaus ir atsako generatoriaus kompleksą, kad gautume daugiau informacijos. Dviejų populiarių atviros srities dialogo duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad ProphetChat gali geriau reaguoti į tvirtas bazes, o tai patvirtina simuliuojamo dialogo ateities privalumus.', 'mk': 'Типичните генеративни дијалошки модели ја користат историјата на дијалогот за генерирање на одговорот. Сепак, со оглед на тоа што еден израз на дијалогот честопати може да се одговори соодветно со повеќе различни одговори, генерирањето желен одговор само врз основа на историските информации не е лесно. Интуитивно, ако chatbot може да предвиде однапред за што ќе зборува корисникот (т.е., иднината на дијалогот) по добивањето на својот одговор, тој би можел да обезбеди поинформативен одговор. Според тоа, предложуваме нова рамка за генерација на дијалог наречена ProphetChat која ги користи симулираните иднини на дијалогот во фазата на инференција за подобрување на генерацијата на одговор. За да го овозможиме чатботот да ја предвиде иднината на дијалогот, дизајнираме стратегија за отворање слична на прозорец за идна симулација на дијалогот користејќи типичен модел на генерација на дијалог и избор на дијалог. Со симулираните иднини, потоа го користиме ансемблот на генератор од историја до одговор и генератор од иднина до одговор за заеднички да генерираме поинформативен одговор. Experiments on two popular open-domain dialogue datasets demonstrate that ProphetChat can generate better responses over strong baselines, which validates the advantages of incorporating the simulated dialogue futures.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ ജെനററിവ് ഡയലോഗ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉത്തരം ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് ചരിത്രം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും, ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് വാക്ക് എപ്പോഴും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മറുപടികളാല്\u200d ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ചരിത്ര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്ക കൃത്യമായി, ഉപയോക്താവ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മുന്നോട്ട് ചാട്ട്ബോട്ട് കാണാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d, അതിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ക Accordingly, we propose a novel dialogue generation framework named ProphetChat that utilizes the simulated dialogue futures in the inference phase to enhance response generation.  ഡയലോഗിന്റെ ഭാവിയെ കാണാന്\u200d ചട്ട്ബോട്ട് പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബീമ്- തെരച്ചില്\u200d പോലുള്ള റോള്\u200d പുറത്തുപോകുന്ന strategy design for future dialog ഭാവിയുടെ പോലെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ചരിത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രതികരിക്കുന്ന ജെനററിന്റെയും ഭാവിയ്ക്കുള്ള പ്രതികര്\u200dത്താവിന്റെയും ജെനററെറെ രണ്ട് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഡൊമൈന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊപ്പെട്ടെച്ചാറ്റ് ശക്തിയുള്ള ബെസ്ലൈനുകളില്\u200d ഉത്തമ', 'mt': 'Mudelli tipiċi ta’ djalogu ġenerattiv jużaw l-istorja tad-djalogu biex jiġġeneraw ir-rispons. Madankollu, peress li dikjarazzjoni ta’ djalogu waħda ta’ spiss tista’ titwieġeb b’mod xieraq b’diversi tweġibiet distinti, il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ rispons mixtieq ibbażat biss fuq l-informazzjoni storika mhijiex faċli. Intwittivament, jekk il-chatbot ikun jista’ jipprevedi minn qabel dwar x’se jitkellem l-utent (jiġifieri, il-futur tad-djalogu) wara li jirċievi r-rispons tiegħu, jista’ possibbilment jipprovdi rispons aktar informattiv. Għaldaqstant, qed nipproponu qafas ġdid ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ djalogu msejjaħ ProphetChat li juża l-futuri tad-djalogu simulat fil-fażi ta’ inferenza biex itejjeb il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ reazzjoni. Sabiex il-chatbot ikun jista’ jipprevedi l-ġejjieni tad-djalogu, a ħna niddisinjaw strateġija ta’ introduzzjoni li tixbaħ lit-tiftix tar-raġġ għal simulazzjoni tad-djalogu fil-ġejjieni bl-użu ta’ mudell tipiku ta’ ġenerazzjoni tad-djalogu u selettur tad-djalogu. Bil-futuri simulati, imbagħad a ħna nużaw l-ensemble ta’ ġeneratur tal-istorja għar-rispons u ġeneratur tal-ġejjieni għar-rispons biex b’mod konġunt niġġeneraw rispons aktar informattiv. L-esperimenti fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta popolari ta’ djalogu open-domain juru li ProphetChat jista’ jiġġenera reazzjonijiet aħjar fuq linji bażi b’saħħithom, li jivvalida l-vantaġġi tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-futuri tad-djalogu simulat.', 'mn': 'Хариулт гаргах үед диалог загварууд диалог түүхийг ашигладаг. Гэхдээ нэг диалог хэлэх нь ихэвчлэн олон ялгаатай хариултаар зөвхөн түүхний мэдээллээр үндсэн зөвхөн хүсэлтэй хариулт үүсгэх нь амархан биш. Хэрвээ шалгалт нь хэрэглэгчийн хариулт авсны дараа ямар талаар ярих талаар өмнө үзэж чадвал илүү мэдээллийн хариулт гаргаж чадна. Тиймээс бид Пайгамбарт нэртэй шинэ диалог бүтээлч хэлбэрийг санал дэвшүүлж, хариу үйлдвэрлэлтийг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд шинэ диалог бүтээлч хэлбэрийг ашигладаг. Диалогдолын ирээдүйг үзэх боломж олгохын тулд бид ирээдүйн диалогын симуляцийг ашиглан диалог бүтээх загвар болон диалог сонгогчийг ашиглан цацраг шиг хайх стратегийг бүтээж байна. Дараа нь бид түүхийн эсвэл хариу үйлдвэрлэгч болон ирээдүйн хариу үйлдвэрлэгч хамтдаа илүү мэдээллийн хариу үйлдвэрлэхийн тулд хэрэглэдэг. Хоёр олон нээлттэй диалог өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт нь Пайгамшин Чат нь хүчтэй суурь шугам дээр илүү сайн хариултыг гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь модельт диалог ирээдүйг бүрдүүлэх талаар шалгаж', 'no': 'Typiske genererande dialogmodeller brukar dialoghistorien for å laga svaret. Men sidan ein dialoguttrykk ofte kan vera tilsvara av fleire ulike svar, er det ikkje enkelt å laga ein ønskte svar bare basert på historiske informasjon. Dette kan kanskje gjere e i meir informativt svar om at samtalen kan foregå fordi kva brukaren skal snakke om (t.d. framtidige dialogvindauget) etter å få svaret. I tillegg foreslår vi eit nytt dialogopprettingsrammeverk med namnet ProphetChat som brukar simulert dialogframtid i infeksjonsfase for å forbetra opprettinga av svar. For å slå på dialogvindauget for å foregå framtida, finn vi ein strategi for å søkja ut som søk på straum for framtidige simulering av dialogvindauget med ein typisk dialogmodell og eit dialogveljar. Med dei simulerte framtidane bruker vi så ein historisk-til-svargenerator og ein framtidige-til-svargenerator for å laga ei meir informativt svar. Eksperimentar på to populære opna domenedialogvindauge viser at ProfeteChat kan laga betre svar over sterke baselinjer, som validerer fordelene til å inkludere simulerte dialogframtida.', 'sr': 'Tipički generični modeli dijaloga koriste povijest dijaloga kako bi stvorili odgovor. Međutim, pošto se jedna reč dijaloga često može odgovoriti na odgovor od višestrukih različitih odgovora, stvaranje željenog odgovora samo na temelju istorijskih informacija nije lako. Intuitivno, ako je otvor unaprijed mogao predvidjeti o čemu bi korisnik razgovarao (tj. budućnost dijaloga) nakon primanja odgovora, možda bi omogućio informativniji odgovor. Stoga predlažemo novi okvir generacije dijaloga po imenu ProphetChat koji koristi simulirane budućnosti dijaloga u fazi infekcije kako bi poboljšali generaciju reakcija. Da bismo omogućili razgovor da predvidi budućnost dijaloga, dizajnirali smo strategiju poput pretraživanja zraka za buduću simulaciju dijaloga koristeći tipični model generacije dijaloga i selektor dijaloga. Sa simuliranim budućnostima, onda koristimo ensemble generator a istorije na odgovor i generatora budućnosti na odgovor da zajedno stvorimo informativniji odgovor. Eksperimenti na dva popularna grupa podataka o otvorenom domenu pokazuju da Proročanstvo može stvoriti bolji odgovor na jake osnovne linije, koja potvrđuje prednosti uključenja budućnosti simuliranog dijaloga.', 'pl': 'Typowe generacyjne modele dialogu wykorzystują historię dialogu do generowania odpowiedzi. Ponieważ jednak na jedną wypowiedź dialogową często można odpowiednio odpowiedzieć wieloma odrębnymi odpowiedziami, generowanie pożądanej odpowiedzi wyłącznie na podstawie informacji historycznych nie jest łatwe. Intuicyjnie, jeśli chatbot może z wyprzedzeniem przewidzieć, o czym użytkownik będzie mówił (tj. dialog przyszłości) po otrzymaniu odpowiedzi, może zapewnić bardziej informacyjną odpowiedź. W związku z tym proponujemy nowy framework generowania dialogu o nazwie ProphetChat, który wykorzystuje symulowane dialogowe przyszłości w fazie wnioskowania, aby zwiększyć generowanie odpowiedzi. Aby umożliwić chatbotowi przewidywanie przyszłości dialogu, projektujemy strategię rozwoju przyszłych symulacji dialogów przy użyciu typowego modelu generowania dialogów i selektora dialogów. Dzięki symulowanej przyszłości wykorzystujemy zespół generatora historii do reakcji i generatora przyszłości do reakcji, aby wspólnie generować bardziej informacyjną odpowiedź. Eksperymenty na dwóch popularnych zestawach danych dialogowych otwartych domen pokazują, że ProphetChat może generować lepsze odpowiedzi na silne linie bazowe, co potwierdza zalety włączenia symulowanych dialogowych przyszłości.', 'ro': 'Modelele tipice de dialog generativ utilizează istoricul dialogurilor pentru a genera răspunsul. Cu toate acestea, deoarece o declarație de dialog poate fi adesea răspuns corespunzător prin mai multe răspunsuri distincte, generarea unui răspuns dorit exclusiv bazat pe informațiile istorice nu este ușoară. Intuitiv, dacă chatbotul poate prevedea în prealabil despre ce va vorbi utilizatorul (adică viitorul dialogului) după primirea răspunsului său, acesta ar putea oferi un răspuns mai informativ. În consecință, propunem un nou cadru de generare a dialogului numit ProphetChat care utilizează viitorul dialogului simulat în faza inferenței pentru a spori generarea de răspunsuri. Pentru a permite chatbotului să prevină viitorul dialogului, proiectăm o strategie de lansare asemănătoare cu raza de căutare pentru simularea viitoare a dialogului folosind un model tipic de generare a dialogului și un selector de dialog. Cu viitorul simulat, folosim apoi ansamblul unui generator istoric-la-răspuns și un generator viitor-la-răspuns pentru a genera împreună un răspuns mai informativ. Experimentele pe două seturi de date populare de dialog cu domeniu deschis demonstrează că ProphetChat poate genera răspunsuri mai bune peste linii de bază puternice, ceea ce validează avantajele încorporării viitorului dialogului simulat.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව නිර්මාණය කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාදය නිර්මාණය සංවාදයේ ඉතිහාසය භාවිත කරන්න. නමුත්, එක සංවාදයක් කියන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විදිහට ඇත්තටම, කතාබට්ටුව පුළුවන් පුළුවන් වුනොත් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයා මොකක්ද කියන්නේ කියලා (ඉතින්, සංවාදය අනාගතය) සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්රමාණ ඉතින්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න සංවාදයක් නාමයි ප්\u200dරශ්න සංවාදයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා සංවාදයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dර සංවාදය අනාගතය බලන්න චැට්බෝට්ව සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාදය නිර්මාණය සහ සංවාදය නිර්මාණය කරන්න සඳහා සංවාදය නිර්ම අනාගත අවස්ථාවක් සමඟ, අපි ඉතිහාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් සහ අනාගතයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපකයෙක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා තව තොරතුරු ප්\u200d ප්\u200dරභාවිත සංවාදය දෙකක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරභාවිත සංවාදයේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා සංවාදය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වි', 'ur': 'جواب جوڑنے کے لئے دائیلوگ تاریخ کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ However, since one dialog speech can often be properly answered by multiple distinct responses, generating a desired response only based on the historical information is not easy. اچھی طرح، اگر چاٹبوٹ آگے سے دیکھ سکتا ہے کہ کارساز کیا بات کرے (یعنی دیوار مستقبل) اس کے جواب حاصل کرنے کے بعد، یہ شاید اس سے زیادہ معلوم جواب دے سکتا ہے۔ اسی طرح ہم پیغمبر چیٹ کے نام سے ایک نئی ڈالیٹ کی نسل فرمود پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو پیغمبر کی نسل کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے سیمولیٹ ڈالیٹ کی آیندگی کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے. چاٹبوٹ کو مستقبل کے آگے دیکھنے کے لئے امکان دینے کے لئے، ہم ایک سیمالیٹ کے مطابق ڈیزائن کر رہے ہیں، سیمالیٹ کے لئے سیمالیٹ کے مطابق ایک سیمالیٹ ڈیزائل کی طرح اور ایک диалог انتخاب کرنے والے. اس کے بعد ہم ایک تاریخ پر جواب دینے والے اور ایک مستقبل پر جواب دینے والی جواب دینے والی جواب دینے والی جواب دینے والے کو استعمال کرتے ہیں دو مشهور کھلے ڈومین ڈائیلوسٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیغمبر چیٹ مضبوط بنسٹ لینوں پر بہترین جواب دینے کی طاقت رکھتا ہے، جو سیمولیٹ ڈائیلوسٹ فوت کے شامل کرنے کے فائدہ کو ثابت کرتا ہے.', 'so': "Tusaalada dialogiga geneeral ee caadiga ah wuxuu isticmaalaa taariikhda dialog si uu u sameeyo jawaabta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, sababtoo ah hadal keliya waxaa inta badan lagu jawaabi karaa jawaabo kala duduwan, sababtoo ah in lagu sameeyo jawaab aad u baahan tahay oo ku saleysan macluumaadka taariikhda oo kaliya. Si dhab ah, haddii uu buugaagtu horay uga hormari karo waxa uu isticmaalayaa (tusaale ahaan mustaqbalka dialogue) ka dib, waxay suurtagal u noqon kartaa jawaab macluumaad dheeraad ah. Sidaas darteed waxaynu soo jeedinnaa dhaqan dialog-nolol ah oo la magacaabaa PropPropProphetChat oo isticmaalaya mustaqbalka dialog-si u eg fasaxa iftiinka si loo kordhiyo response generation. Si aan u fududeyno chatbot in uu horumariyo mustaqbalka dialogka, waxaynu u qoraynaa qoraal looga baaraandegayo sawir u eg qoraalka mustaqbalka ah, si aan u isticmaalno model muuqashada dialog ah iyo doorasha dialog. Waxaynu isticmaalaynaa muuqata mustaqbalka, kadibna waxaynu isticmaalnaa nidaamka dhaqaalaha taariikhda-ka-jawaabta iyo generator mustaqbalka-ka-jawaabta si ay wadajir ugu dhashaan jawaab macluumaad badan. Imtixaan ku qoran labada macluumaad oo popular ah oo ku qoran diyaarinta dowladda oo furan waxay muujiyaan in PropertChat uu ka sameyn karo jawaabo ka wanaagsan oo ka sareeya saldhigyada xoogga badan, kaas oo xaqiijiyaa faa'iidada ku qoritaanka mustaqbalka dialog siman.", 'sv': 'Typiska generativa dialogmodeller använder dialoghistoriken för att generera svaret. Men eftersom en dialog ofta kan besvaras på lämpligt sätt genom flera olika svar, är det inte lätt att generera ett önskat svar enbart baserat på historisk information. Intuitivt, om chatbot i förväg kan förutse vad användaren skulle tala om (dvs. dialogens framtid) efter att ha fått sitt svar, kan den möjligen ge ett mer informativt svar. Följaktligen föreslår vi ett nytt dialoggenereringsramverk som heter ProphetChat som använder simulerade dialogframtider i inferensfasen för att förbättra responsgenereringen. För att chatbot ska kunna förutse dialogens framtid utformar vi en beam-search-liknande roll-out strategi för dialog framtida simulering med hjälp av en typisk dialoggenerationsmodell och en dialogväljare. Med den simulerade framtiden använder vi sedan ensemblen av en historia-till-svar generator och en framtid-till-svar generator för att gemensamt generera en mer informativ respons. Experiment på två populära dialogdataset med öppen domän visar att ProphetChat kan generera bättre svar över starka baslinjer, vilket bekräftar fördelarna med att införliva simulerade dialogframtider.', 'ta': 'Typical generative dialogue models utilize the dialogue history to generate the response.  இருந்தாலும், ஏனெனில் ஒரு உரையாடல் பேச்சு பெரும்பாலும் பல வித்தியாசமான விடைகளால் பதில் வழங்கப்பட முடியும், வரலாற்று தகவலை அடிப் குறிப்பில், பயனர் எதைப் பற்றி பேசுவார்கள் என்பதை முன்னால் அரட்டை பார்க்கலாம் (அதாவது, உரையாடல் எதிர்காலத்)தை பெற்றால், அது அதற்கு மேலும்  ஆகையால், நாம் ஒரு புதிய உரையாடல் உரையாடல் உருவாக்கும் சட்டத்தை பெயரிடப்பட்ட PropertChat என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது போன்ற உரையாடல் எதிர்கால உரையாடல் எதிர்காலத்தை பார்க்க அரட்டை செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு beam- search- like roll- out strategy designed for future dialog simulation using a typical dialog generation model and a dialog selector. பார்க்கப்பட்ட எதிர்காலத்தில், பின்னர் நாம் வரலாற்றில் இருக்கும் பதில் உருவாக்குபவரின் ஒத்திசையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு எதிர இரண்டு பிரபலமான திறந்த டோமைன் உரையாடல் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது Property Chat வலுப்படையான அடிப்படைகளில் சிறந்த பதில்களை உருவாக்க முடியும், அது போ', 'uz': "Oddiy generativ dialog modellari javob yaratish uchun muloqat tarixidan foydalanadi. Lekin, chunki bir muloqat so'zlari ko'plab turli javoblar tomoniga javob beradi, tarixi maʼlumotiga asosida yetish kerak javob yaratish oson emas. @ info Shunday qilib, biz PropProphetChat nomli yangi dialog yaratish freymini taqdim qilamiz, bu javob generalidan foydalanish uchun taxminan muloqat kelajatlaridan foydalanadi. Name Kelajak bilan biz tarix- javob generator va kelajakdagi javob yaratuvchidan foydalanamiz va bir necha xizmatga javob beruvchi generatorini birlashtirish uchun bir xil maʼlumot javob yaratish uchun. Name", 'vi': 'Các một cách truyền thống vĩ đại dùng sự thống của lịch báo để trả lời. Tuy nhiên, vì một lời khai thoại có thể được trả lời thích hợp bằng nhiều phản ứng khác nhau, tạo ra một phản ứng mong muốn chỉ dựa trên thông tin lịch sử không dễ dàng. Trực giác, nếu con robot của Chatur có thể đoán trước những gì người dùng sẽ nói về (tức là tương lai cuộc đối thoại) sau khi nhận được phản ứng, nó có thể cung cấp một phản ứng thông tin hơn. Vì vậy, chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống tạo ra cuộc đối thoại mới tên là Prophet Chat, người sử dụng các tương lai cuộc đối thoại mô phỏng trong giai đoạn nhận biết để tăng cường thế hệ phản ứng. Để cho con robot biết trước tương lai cuộc đối thoại, chúng ta thiết kế một chiến lược tìm tia sáng để mô phỏng cuộc đối thoại trong tương lai, sử dụng một mô hình đời truyền hình và một máy chọn đối thoại. Với các tương lai mô phỏng, chúng tôi sử dụng dàn hợp của một máy phát từ lịch sử đáp và một máy phát điện đáp tương lai để tạo ra một phản ứng thông tin hơn. Các thí nghiệm trên hai tập tin dữ liệu cuộc đối thoại công khai phổ biến chứng minh rằng Prophet Chat có thể tạo ra phản ứng tốt hơn những bản mẫu mạnh, nó xác nhận lợi ích của việc lắp đặt tương lai cuộc đối thoại mô phỏng.', 'bg': 'Типичните модели на генеративни диалози използват историята на диалога, за да генерират отговора. Въпреки това, тъй като една реч на диалога често може да бъде адекватно отговорена чрез множество отделни отговори, генерирането на желания отговор единствено въз основа на историческата информация не е лесно. Интуитивно, ако чатботът може предварително да предвиди за какво би говорил потребителят (т.е. бъдещето на диалога) след получаване на своя отговор, той може да предостави по-информативен отговор. Съответно, ние предлагаме нова рамка за генериране на диалог наречена Пророчен чат, която използва симулираните диалогови фючърси във фазата на заключение, за да подобри генерирането на отговор. За да позволим на чатбота да предвиди бъдещето на диалога, ние проектираме стратегия за внедряване, подобна на лъч, за бъдеща симулация на диалога, използвайки типичен модел за генериране на диалог и селектор на диалог. С симулираните фючърси използваме ансамбъла от генератор история към отговор и генератор бъдеще към отговор, за да генерираме съвместно по-информативен отговор. Експериментите с два популярни диалогови набора от данни с отворен домейн показват, че може да генерира по-добри отговори през силни базови линии, което потвърждава предимствата на включването на симулираните диалогови фючърси.', 'nl': 'Typische generatieve dialoogmodellen gebruiken de dialooggeschiedenis om de reactie te genereren. Echter, aangezien één dialoog uitspraak vaak adequaat kan worden beantwoord door meerdere verschillende antwoorden, is het niet eenvoudig om een gewenste reactie te genereren op basis van de historische informatie. Intuïtief, als de chatbot van tevoren kan voorzien waar de gebruiker over zou praten (d.w.z. de dialoogtoekomst) na ontvangst van zijn reactie, zou hij mogelijk een meer informatieve reactie kunnen geven. Daarom stellen we een nieuw dialoog generatie framework voor genaamd ProphetChat dat de gesimuleerde dialoogfutures in de inferentiefase gebruikt om respons generatie te verbeteren. Om de chatbot in staat te stellen de dialoogtoekomst te voorspellen, ontwerpen we een beam-search-achtige roll-out strategie voor dialoogtoekomstige simulatie met behulp van een typisch dialooggeneratiemodel en een dialoogselector. Met de gesimuleerde futures maken we vervolgens gebruik van het ensemble van een history-to-response generator en een future-to-response generator om gezamenlijk een meer informatieve reactie te genereren. Experimenten op twee populaire open-domein dialoogdatasets tonen aan dat ProphetChat betere reacties kan genereren over sterke baselines, wat de voordelen van het opnemen van de gesimuleerde dialoogfutures valideert.', 'de': 'Typische generative Dialogmodelle nutzen die Dialoghistorie, um die Antwort zu generieren. Da jedoch eine Dialogäußerung oft durch mehrere unterschiedliche Antworten angemessen beantwortet werden kann, ist es nicht einfach, eine gewünschte Antwort allein auf der Grundlage der historischen Informationen zu generieren. Intuitiv, wenn der Chatbot im Voraus vorhersehen kann, worüber der Nutzer nach Erhalt seiner Antwort sprechen würde (d.h. die Dialogzukunft), könnte er möglicherweise eine informativere Antwort liefern. Dementsprechend schlagen wir ein neuartiges Dialoggenerierungsframework namens ProphetChat vor, das die simulierten Dialogzukünfte in der Inferenzphase nutzt, um die Antwortgenerierung zu verbessern. Damit der Chatbot die Zukunft des Dialogs vorhersehen kann, entwerfen wir mit Hilfe eines typischen Dialoggenerierungsmodells und eines Dialogselektors eine beamsuchähnliche Roll-out-Strategie für die Dialogzukunftsimulation. Bei der simulierten Zukunft nutzen wir dann das Ensemble eines History-to-Response-Generators und eines Future-to-Response-Generators, um gemeinsam eine informativere Antwort zu generieren. Experimente an zwei populären Open-Domain-Dialogdatensätzen zeigen, dass ProphetChat bessere Antworten über starke Baselines generieren kann, was die Vorteile der Integration der simulierten Dialog-Futures bestätigt.', 'hr': 'Tipički generični modeli dijaloga koriste povijest dijaloga kako bi stvorili odgovor. Međutim, pošto se jedna izjava dijaloga često može odgovoriti na odgovor višestrukim različitim odgovorima, stvaranje željenog odgovora samo na temelju povijesnih informacija nije lako. Intuitivno, ako je otvor unaprijed mogao predvidjeti o čemu bi korisnik govorio (tj. budućnost dijaloga) nakon primanja odgovora, moguće bi pružio informativniji odgovor. Stoga predlažemo novi okvir generacije dijaloga po imenu ProphetChat koji koristi simulirane budućnosti dijaloga u fazi infekcije kako bi poboljšali generaciju odgovora. Da bismo omogućili razgovor za predviđanje budućnosti dijaloga, dizajnirali smo strategiju poput pretraživanja zraka za buduću simulaciju dijaloga koristeći tipični model generacije dijaloga i selektor dijaloga. S simuliranim budućnostima, onda koristimo ensemble generator a povijesti na odgovor i generatora budućnosti na odgovor kako bi zajedno stvorili informativniji odgovor. Eksperimenti na dva popularna podataka o dialogu otvorenom domenu pokazuju da prorok Chat može stvoriti bolji odgovor na jake osnovne linije, koji potvrđuje prednosti uključujući simulirane budućnosti dijaloga.', 'da': 'Typiske generative dialogmodeller bruger dialoghistorikken til at generere svaret. Men da en dialogudtalelse ofte kan besvares korrekt af flere forskellige svar, er det ikke let at generere et ønsket svar udelukkende baseret på historiske oplysninger. Intuitivt, hvis chatbot på forhånd kan forudse, hvad brugeren vil tale om (dvs. dialogens fremtid) efter at have modtaget sit svar, kan den muligvis give et mere informativt svar. Derfor foreslår vi en ny dialog generation ramme ved navn ProphetChat, der bruger simuleret dialog fremtid i inference fasen til at forbedre responsgenerering. For at gøre chatbot i stand til at forudse dialogens fremtid, designer vi en beam-search-lignende roll-out strategi for dialog fremtidig simulering ved hjælp af en typisk dialog generation model og en dialogvælger. Med de simulerede fremtider bruger vi derefter ensemblet af en historie-til-respons generator og en fremtid-til-respons generator til i fællesskab at generere en mere informativ respons. Eksperimenter med to populære open-domæne dialogdatasæt viser, at ProphetChat kan generere bedre svar i forhold til stærke basislinjer, hvilket validerer fordelene ved at indarbejde den simulerede dialogfremtid.', 'id': 'Model dialog generatif tipis menggunakan sejarah dialog untuk menghasilkan respon. Namun, karena satu ucapan dialog sering dapat dijawab dengan sesuai dengan beberapa respon yang jelas, menghasilkan respon yang diinginkan hanya berdasarkan informasi sejarah tidak mudah. Secara intuitif, jika chatbot dapat memprediksi secara awal apa yang akan dibicarakan pengguna (i.e., dialog masa depan) setelah menerima responnya, mungkin dapat memberikan respon yang lebih informatif. Oleh karena itu, kami mengusulkan cadangan generasi dialog baru bernama ProphetChat yang menggunakan masa depan dialog simulasi dalam fase kesimpulan untuk meningkatkan generasi respon. Untuk memungkinkan chatbot untuk memprediksi dialog masa depan, kami merancang strategi pencarian sinar untuk simulasi dialog masa depan menggunakan model generasi dialog tipis dan pemilih dialog. Dengan masa depan simulasi, kita kemudian menggunakan ensemble dari generator sejarah-ke-respon dan generator masa depan-ke-respon untuk bersama-sama menghasilkan respon yang lebih informatif. Experiments on two popular open-domain dialogue datasets demonstrate that ProphetChat can generate better responses over strong baselines, which validates the advantages of incorporating the simulated dialogue futures.', 'ko': '전형적인 생성적 대화 모델은 대화의 역사를 이용하여 응답을 한다.그러나 하나의 대화어는 보통 여러 개의 다른 대답으로 적절하게 대답할 수 있기 때문에 역사적 정보에 따라 필요한 대답만 하기는 쉽지 않다.직감적으로 만약에 채팅 로봇이 사용자가 회답을 받은 후에 어떤 이야기(즉 미래의 대화)를 할지 미리 예견할 수 있다면 더욱 정보적인 회답을 제공할 수 있을 것이다.따라서 우리는 ProphetChat이라는 새로운 대화 생성 프레임워크를 제시했는데 이 프레임워크는 추리 단계의 모의 대화 미래를 이용하여 응답 생성을 강화한다.채팅 로봇이 대화의 미래를 예견할 수 있도록 우리는 전형적인 대화 생성 모델과 대화 선택기를 사용하여 웨이브 검색과 유사한 대화 미래 시뮬레이션 전개 전략을 설계했다.미래를 모의한 다음에 우리는 역사 응답 생성기와 미래 응답 생성기의 통합을 이용하여 정보량의 더 큰 응답을 공동으로 생성한다.두 개의 유행하는 개방역 대화 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 ProphetChat가 강한 기선에서 더욱 좋은 응답을 할 수 있음을 보여 시뮬레이션 대화를 결합하는 장점을 검증했다.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa mazungumzo ya kawaida hutumia historia ya mazungumzo ili kutengeneza majibu. Hata hivyo, kwa kuwa hotuba moja ya mazungumzo yanaweza kupatikana kwa kiasi kikubwa na miitikio mbalimbali, kutengeneza jibu linalohitajika kwa kutumia taarifa za kihistoria si rahisi. Kwa ujumla, kama kituo hicho kinaweza kutazama mbele kile mtumiaji angechokuwa akizungumzia (yaani, mustakabali wa mazungumzo) baada ya kupokea majibu yake, inaweza kutoa majibu zaidi ya taarifa. Kwa hiyo, tunapendekeza muundo wa mazungumzo ya kitaifa unaoitwa PropProphetChat unaotumia mustakabali wa mazungumzo yanayofanana katika kiwango cha kutokea kwa ajili ya kuongeza kizazi cha majibu. Ili kuweza kuona mazungumzo ya baadae, tunaunda mkakati wa kutafuta mijadala inayofanana na mifumo ya kutafuta ubunifu kwa ajili ya simulizi ya baadaye ya mazungumzo kwa kutumia muundo wa kizazi cha kawaida wa mazungumzo na mteule wa mazungumzo. Wakati mustakabali unaofanana, kisha tunatumia mfululizo wa mtengenezaji wa historia na mwitikio na mtengenezaji wa mustakabali wa kujibu kwa pamoja kutengeneza jibu la taarifa zaidi. Majaribio kwenye seti mbili maarufu za mazungumzo ya ndani yanaonyesha kuwa Utagaji wa Mazungumzo yanaweza kutengeneza miitikio bora zaidi zaidi ya misingi yenye nguvu, ambayo inathibitisha faida ya kuingiza mustakabali wa mazungumzo yanayofanana.', 'fa': 'مدلهای محاورۀ پیدا کردن معمولی تاریخ محاورۀ محاورۀ استفاده می\u200cکند تا جواب را تولید کند. با این حال، چون یک سخنرانی گفتگو اغلب می\u200cتواند با پاسخ\u200cهای متفاوتی به مناسب جواب داده شود، جواب خواسته\u200cای تنها بر اساس اطلاعات تاریخی آسان نیست. با وجود اینکه اگر صحبت بتواند پیش بینی کند که کاربر در مورد چی صحبت می کند (یعنی آینده صحبت) بعد از پذیرفتن پاسخ خود، ممکن است یک جواب اطلاعات بیشتری را پیش بینی کند. بنابراین، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب نسل محاورۀ تازه\u200cای به نام پیامبر چت که از آینده\u200cهای محاورۀ شبیه\u200cسازی در مرحله\u200cی آلودگی استفاده می\u200cکند تا نسل پاسخ را بیشتر کند. برای اینکه بتوانیم صحبت را برای پیش بینی آینده صحبت کنیم، ما یک استراتژی جستجویی شبیه چراغ برای شبیه سازی آینده صحبت را با استفاده از یک مدل نسل محاوره معمولی و یک انتخاب محاوره طراحی می کنیم. با آینده\u200cهای شبیه\u200cسازی، سپس از طریق یک ژنراتور تاریخ به پاسخ و یک ژنراتور آینده به پاسخ\u200cسازی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک جواب اطلاعات بیشتری را به همدیگر تولید کند. تجربه\u200cها در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای دیوار باز دامنی محبوب نشان می\u200cدهند که پیامبر چات می\u200cتواند پاسخ\u200cهای بهتر بر خط\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای قوی تولید کند، که سودهای شامل آینده\u200cهای دیوار شبیه\u200cسازی را تایید می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Ýeri janlaşdyrmak üçin dürli dälog modleri janlaşdyrýar Ýöne, bir dialogyň sözlerini köplenç a ýratyn jogaplar tarapyndan gowy jogap berip bilýär, diňe taryhy maglumatyna daýanýan bir jogap döredişi aňsat däl. Eger bu hat öñünden ullanyşyň näme hakda gürleşenini (meseläm, gelejegi dialog) berip bilen bolsa, ol özüniň jogabyny alandan soňra köp informatif jogaby töwek edip biler. Şol sebäpli biz Profesýet Chat diýip atlandyrylýan bir dialog döredigini teklip edip, çykyş döredigine jogap döredigini geliştirmek üçin simulasyonat döredigini ulanýar. Çaptyň gelejegini öň görebilmek üçin, biz dijalog bejermek üçin bir şekilde örnekli dijal döredişi we bir dijal seçgisi ullanýarys Simüle edilen gelejekler bilen, soňra geçmiş-ýa-jogabat jeneratorynyň we gelejekde-ýa-jogabat jeneratorynyň kop informative bir jogabat üretmek üçin ullanýarys. Iki meşhur aç-domen dialoog sanatyndaky öränler şöwzih edip bilýän çykyşlaryň güýçli baseliniň üstünde gowy jogaplary döredip bilýändigini kanıtlaýar. Bu simulatik dialoog futuryny dahyl etmek üçin ejazanlaryny tassyklaýar.', 'am': 'የተለመደው አቀማመጥ ምንም እንኳን፣ አንዲት ጥያቄ ንግግር ብዙ ጊዜ በተለየ መልስ በመስጠት ይችላልና፣ ታሪካዊ መረጃ በመሠረት የተፈቀደ መልስ ቀላል አይደለም፡፡ በአጠቃላይ፣ በተጨማሪው መልስ ከመቀበል በኋላ የተጠቃሚ የሚጠይቁት (ምናልባት የመስኮቱ ቀዳሚ) ምን እንደሆነ አስቀድሞ ያሳየዋል፡፡ ስለዚህም፣ PropPropPropertChat የሚባልን የዳይመት አቀማመጥ መፍጠር እናስጀጋለን፡፡ dialogs-action በተመሳሳይ ግንኙነት፣ ከዚያም በኋላ ታሪክ-ለጥያቄ አዳራጅ እና ፍጻሜ-ለጥያቄ መልስ አቀማሚ እና በተጨማሪው የጠያፍ መልስ መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለት ባሕላዊ ክፍት ዶሜን ዳታዎችን በመስጠት መክፈት የProperty Chat በኃይለኛ መሠረት ላይ የሚሻለውን መልስ ሊያደርግ ይችላል፡፡', 'af': "Tipe genereer dialoog modele gebruik die dialoog geskiedenis om die antwoord te genereer. Maar omdat een dialoog uitspraak dikwels deur veelvuldige verskillende antwoordes behoorlik kan wees, genereer 'n versoekte antwoord slegs gebaseer op die historiese inligting is nie maklik nie. Intuitief, as die chatbot voorskou kan voorskou wat die gebruiker sou praat (i.e. die dialoog toekoms) nadat sy antwoord ontvang het, kan dit moontlik 'n meer informatiewe antwoord verskaf. Ons voorstel daarom 'n nuwe dialoog generasie raamwerk genaamd Profeet Chat wat die simuleerde dialoog futures in die inferensie fase gebruik om reaksogensie te verbeter. Om die gesprekslys te aktiveer om die dialoog toekoms te sien, ontwerp ons 'n trap-soektog-soos rol-uit strategie vir die dialoog toekomstige simulasie te gebruik met 'n tipiese dialoog generasie model en 'n dialoog kieser. Met die simuleerde futures gebruik ons dan die ensemble van 'n geskiedenis-na-antwoordegenerator en 'n toekomstige-na-antwoordegenerator om joint 'n meer informatiewe antwoord te genereer. Eksperimente op twee populêre open-domein dialoog datastelle bevestig dat profeet Chat beter antwoordes oor sterke basisline kan genereer, wat die voordele van die simuleerde dialoog futures bevestig.", 'sq': 'Modelet tipike gjenerative të dialogut përdorin historinë e dialogut për të gjeneruar përgjigjen. Megjithatë, pasi një shprehje dialogu shpesh mund të përgjigjet në mënyrë të përshtatshme nga përgjigje të shumta të veçanta, gjenerimi i një përgjigje të dëshiruar vetëm bazuar në informacionin historik nuk është i lehtë. Në mënyrë intuitive, nëse chatbot i mund të parashikojë përpara se për çfarë do të flasë përdoruesi (pra, dialogu i ardhshëm) pasi të marrë përgjigjen e tij, ai mund të ofrojë një përgjigje më informative. Sipas kësaj, ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri të gjenerimit të dialogut të quajtur ProphetChat që përdorë të ardhmen e simuluar të dialogut në fazën e përfundimit për të përmirësuar gjenerimin e përgjigjes. Për të mundësuar chatbotin të parashikojë të ardhmen e dialogut, ne dizajnojmë një strategji të përdorimit të kërkimit në rreze për simulimin e ardhshëm të dialogut duke përdorur një model tipik të gjenerimit të dialogut dhe një zgjedhës dialogu. Me të ardhmen e simuluar, ne pastaj përdorim ansamblin e një gjeneratori historie-për-reagim dhe një gjeneratori të ardhshëm-për-reagim për të gjeneruar së bashku një përgjigje më informative. Eksperimentet në dy grupe të dhënash popullore të dialogut të dominiu të hapur demonstrojnë se ProphetChat mund të gjenerojë përgjigje më të mira mbi linjat bazë të forta, gjë që vlerëson avantazhet e përfshirjes së së ardhmes së simulimit të dialogut.', 'hy': 'Տիպիկ սերունդային հաղորդակցման մոդելները օգտագործում են հաղորդակցման պատմությունը պատասխանի ստեղծելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, քանի որ մի խոսակցության արտահայտությունը հաճախ կարող է ճիշտ պատասխանել բազմաթիվ տարբեր պատասխաններով, ցանկալի պատասխան ստեղծելը միայն պատմական տեղեկատվության վրա հեշտ չէ: Ինտուիտիվ, եթե շաթբոտը կարող է նախօրոք կանխատեսել, թե ինչի մասին է խոսում օգտագործողը (այսինքն, ապագա երկխոսությունը) իր պատասխանից ստանալուց հետո, այն կարող է հնարավոր լինել ավելի ինֆորմատիվ պատասխան: Հետևաբար, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խոսակցության ստեղծման շրջանակ, որը կոչվում է «ProfetChat», որը օգտագործում է սիմուլյացված խոսակցության ապագաները հետևյալ փուլում արձագանքի ստեղծման բարելավման համար: Որպեսզի շաթբոտը կարողանա նախատեսել պատմությունը ապագայի, մենք ստեղծում ենք պատճառով ճառագայթի որոնման նման թափանցիկ ստեղծագործման ռազմավարություն ապագայի սիմուլյացիայի համար, օգտագործելով տիպիկ պատմություն ստեղծող մոդել և պատ Սիմուլյացված ապագաների հետ մենք հետո օգտագործում ենք պատմության-արձագանքի գեներատորի և ապագա-արձագանքի գեներատորի համախումբը, որպեսզի միասին ստեղծենք ավելի ինֆորմատիվ արձագանք: Երկու հայտնի բաց բնագավառի երկու համակարգի տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ PROPHEtChat կարող է ավելի լավ պատասխաններ ստեղծել ուժեղ հիմնական գծերի միջոցով, ինչը ստուգում է սիմուլյացված երկու ապագաների ներգրավման առավելությունները:', 'az': 'Tipik nütfədir dialoq modelləri cavab yaratmaq üçün dijalog keçmişini istifadə edirlər. Ancaq bir diyalət sözləri çox müxtəlif cavab verən kimi çox müxtəlif cavab verə bilər, istədiyi cavab yalnız tarihi məlumatına dayanan olaraq asan deyildir. Əgər çəkidən əvvəlcə istifadəçin in nələr barəsində danışacağını öyrənə bilərsə, bu daha informativ cavab verə bilər. Beləliklə, biz Peyğəmbər Chat adlı yeni dialoq nəslini təbliğ edirik ki, reaksiya nəslini daha da artırmaq üçün simulatlı dialoq gələcəklərini istifadə edir. Dialog gələcəyini öyrənmək üçün çəkişmə mümkün olmaq üçün, müxtəlif dijalog nəzəriyyəti modeli və диалог seçicisi ilə müəyyən ediləcək müəyyən müəyyən etdik. Simülatlı gələcəklər ilə, sonra tarihin-cavab generatörünün və gələcək-cavab generatörünü birlikdə informatif bir cavab yaratmaq üçün istifadə edirik. İki məşhur açıq-domani verilən məlumatların sınaqları göstərir ki, Peyğəmbər Chat qüvvətli səhifələrin üstündə daha yaxşı cavab verə bilər, bu da simulasyon dijaloğu gələcəklərini təsdiqləyir.', 'bn': 'সাধারণ জেনারেটিভ ডায়ালগ মডেল ব্যবহার করে প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করার জন্য ডায়ালগ ইতিহাস ব্যবহার করে। তবে যেহেতু একটি ডায়ালগ বাক্য প্রায়শই বিভিন্ন প্রতিক্রিয়া দ্বারা প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদান করতে পারে, যেহেতু ঐতিহাসিক তথ্যের উপর ভিত যদি চ্যাটবোট আগে দেখতে পায় ব্যবহারকারীরা (যেমন ডায়ালগ ভবিষ্যৎ) তার প্রতিক্রিয়া পেয়ার পর ব্যবহারকারীরা কি সম্পর্কে কথা বলতে পারে, তবে এটি সম্ভবত যার ফলে আমরা প্রফেটচ্যাট নামের একটি নোডেল ডায়ালগ প্রজন্মের প্রস্তাব করছি যা প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্মের বৃদ্ধি প্রদানের জন্য সংক্রান্ত ডা ডায়ালগের ভবিষ্যত দেখার জন্য চ্যাটবোট সক্রিয় করার জন্য, আমরা একটি বীম-অনুসন্ধানের মত রোল- আউট কৌশলটি ডিজাইন করি ভবিষ্যতের ডায়ালগ সিমুলেশনের জন্য একটি সা সমতুল্য ভবিষ্যতের সাথে আমরা একটি ইতিহাস-প্রতিক্রিয়া জেনারেটরের সাথে ব্যবহার করি এবং একটি ভবিষ্যতের প্রতিক্রিয়া জেনারেটরের ব্যবহার করি যা দুটি জনপ্রিয় ডোমেইন ডায়ালগ ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে প্রফেটচ্যাট শক্তিশালী বেসারের উপর ভালো প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করতে পারে, যা সমতুল্য ডায়ালগ ভবি', 'bs': 'Tipički generični modeli dijaloga koriste povijest dijaloga kako bi stvorili odgovor. Međutim, pošto se jedna govor dijaloga često može odgovoriti na odgovor od višestrukih različitih odgovora, stvaranje željenog odgovora samo na temelju istorijskih informacija nije lako. Intuitivno, ako je otvor unaprijed mogao predvidjeti o čemu bi korisnik govorio (tj. budućnost dijaloga) nakon primanja odgovora, moglo bi pružit i informativniji odgovor. Stoga predlažemo novi okvir generacije dijaloga po imenu ProphetChat koji koristi simulirane budućnosti dijaloga u fazi infekcije kako bi poboljšali generaciju odgovora. Da bismo omogućili razgovor da predvidi budućnost dijaloga, dizajnirali smo strategiju poput pretraživanja zraka za buduću simulaciju dijaloga koristeći tipični model generacije dijaloga i selektor dijaloga. Sa simuliranim budućnostima, onda koristimo ensemble generator a povijesti na odgovor i generatora budućnosti na odgovor kako bi zajedno stvorili informativniji odgovor. Eksperimenti na dva popularna grupa podataka o otvorenom domenu pokazuju da Proročanstvo može stvoriti bolji odgovor na jake osnovne linije, koja potvrđuje prednosti uključenja budućnosti simuliranog dijaloga.', 'ca': "Els típics models de diàleg generador utilitzen la història del diàleg per generar la resposta. Però, com que sovint una expressió de diàleg pot ser resposta adequadament per múltiples respostes distintes, generar una resposta desitjada basada únicament en la informació històrica no és fàcil. Intuïtivament, si el chatbot pot preveure anticipadament de què parlaria l'usuari (és a dir, el futur diàleg) després de rebre la seva resposta, potser podria proporcionar una resposta més informativa. Per tant, proposem un nou marc de generació de diàleg anomenat ProphetChat que utilitza els futurs del diàleg simulat en la fase de inferència per millorar la generació de resposta. Per poder que el chatbot prevea el futur diàleg, dissenyem una estratègia d'implantació semblant a una cerca de raig per a simular el futur diàleg fent servir un model típic de generació de diàleg i un selector de diàleg. Amb els futurs simulats, llavors utilitzem el conjunt d'un generador història a resposta i un generador futur a resposta per generar conjuntament una resposta més informativa. Els experiments en dos conjunts de dades populars de diàleg de domini obert demostren que ProphetChat pot generar millors respostes a través de fortes línies de base, que valida els avantatges d'incorporar els futurs del diàleg simulat.", 'cs': 'Typické generační modely dialogu využívají historii dialogu k generování odpovědi. Vzhledem k tomu, že jedna dialogová výslova může být často vhodně zodpovězena několika odlišnými odpověďmi, není snadné vytvořit požadovanou odpověď pouze na základě historických informací. Intuitivně, pokud chatbot může předem předvídat, o čem bude uživatel mluvit (tj. budoucnost dialogu) po obdržení odpovědi, mohl by poskytnout informačnější odpověď. Proto navrhujeme nový rámec pro generování dialogů s názvem ProphetChat, který využívá simulované dialogové budoucnosti ve fázi inference k zlepšení generování reakcí. Aby chatbot mohl předvídat budoucnost dialogu, navrhujeme strategii vyhledávání paprsku pro simulaci budoucnosti dialogu s využitím typického modelu generování dialogu a selektoru dialogu. S simulovanými budoucnostmi pak využíváme soubor generátoru historie-odezvy a generátoru budoucnosti-odezvy, abychom společně generovali informativnější odezvu. Experimenty na dvou populárních databázích otevřené domény ukazují, že ProphetChat může generovat lepší reakce na silné základní linie, což ověřuje výhody začlenění simulovaných dialogových budoucností.', 'et': 'Tüüpilised generatiivsed dialoogimudelid kasutavad dialoogi ajalugu vastuse genereerimiseks. Kuna aga ühele dialoogi väljendusele võib sageli vastata mitme erineva vastusega, ei ole soovitud vastuse loomine üksnes ajaloolise teabe põhjal lihtne. Intuitiivselt, kui chatbot suudab ette näha, millest kasutaja räägib (st dialoogi tulevikust) pärast vastuse saamist, võib ta anda informatiivsema vastuse. Seetõttu pakume välja uudse dialoogi genereerimise raamistiku nimega ProphetChat, mis kasutab järeldusetapis simuleeritud dialoogi tulevikku reaktsiooni genereerimise parandamiseks. Et jutubot saaks dialoogi tulevikku ette näha, kujundame dialoogi tuleviku simulatsiooniks kiire otsinguga sarnase strateegia, kasutades tüüpilist dialoogi genereerimise mudelit ja dialoogi valijat. Simuleeritud tulevikuga kasutame seejärel ajaloo-reageerimise generaatori ja tuleviku-reageerimise generaatori ansamblit, et luua ühiselt informatiivsem vastus. Kahe populaarse avatud domeeni dialoogi andmekogumiga tehtud eksperimendid näitavad, et ProphetChat suudab luua paremaid vastuseid tugevate lähtejoonte kaudu, mis kinnitab simuleeritud dialoogi tuleviku kaasamise eeliseid.', 'fi': 'Tyypilliset generatiiviset dialogimallit hyödyntävät dialogihistoriaa vastauksen tuottamiseen. Koska yhteen dialogilauselmaan voidaan kuitenkin usein vastata asianmukaisesti useilla erillisillä vastauksilla, ei ole helppoa luoda haluttua vastausta pelkästään historialliseen tietoon perustuen. Intuitiivisesti, jos chatbotti pystyy ennakoimaan etukäteen, mistä käyttäjä puhuu (eli dialogin tulevaisuudesta) vastauksensa saatuaan, se voisi mahdollisesti tarjota informatiivisemman vastauksen. Tämän vuoksi ehdotamme uutta dialogin generointikehystä nimeltä ProphetChat, joka hyödyntää simuloituja dialogin tulevaisuuksia päättelyvaiheessa vastauksen generoinnin tehostamiseksi. Jotta chatbot voisi ennakoida dialogin tulevaisuutta, suunnittelemme keilahallin kaltaisen käyttöönoton strategian dialogin tulevaisuuden simulointiin käyttäen tyypillistä dialogin luontimallia ja dialogin valitsinta. Simuloitujen futuurien avulla hyödynnämme historiasta vasteeseen -generaattorin ja tulevaisuudesta vasteeseen -generaattorin muodostamaa kokonaisuutta yhdessä informatiivisemman vasteen tuottamiseksi. Kahdella suositulla avoimen verkkotunnuksen dialogitiedostolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että ProphetChat voi tuottaa parempia vastauksia vahvojen lähtölinjojen yli, mikä vahvistaa simuloitujen dialogitiedostojen edut.', 'jv': 'thumbnail politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness buddy Kaya, awak dhéwé ngerasakno perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno anu barêng-barêng nganggo "prof Talk" sing nguasakno sistem sing beraksi kanggo ngilanggar efes kejahatan kanggo ngerasakno ujian. Ing oleh nggawe kno kanggo ngilanggar bebasan dialog, kita ngubah perusahaan langgar tarjamahan Ganggo Simulasi budhakan, kita ngupakan pengguna perusahaan kelas nggawe tarjamah-karo repayasi lan mbutuhak-karo repayasi nggo ngerayakno Gebudhakan langkung durung populer open-domain dialog dataset dumplikasun dianggawe Daftar Advisane iso nggawe responskapan sing luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe barang sistem sing gak dhéwé, sing kotakan nggawe bener kanggo sampeyan dialog kebebasan dumadhi.', 'ha': "@ action Kayya, amma, da yawa za'a iya karɓa da magana guda a cikin zauren akwatin bayani na kamata ana iya daidai da jibo masu buƙata dabam-dabam, kuma mai ƙãga matsayin da aka so ba zai zama mai sauƙi ba, a kan bincike information na historian. Taƙaitacce, idan mazaɓa ya iya gano a gaba ga abin da mai amfani da shi zai yi magana (misali, wanda ake buka zauren akwatin bayani) a bayani na motsa, za'a iya ƙara wani jibi na gane. Kamar wannan, Muke ƙayyade wani firam na zauren akwatin bayani na yanzu ta yanzu, ana yi amfani da wanda ke samu'a cikin zauren akwatin bayanin da aka samu'a cikin fassarar kasa wa ƙarani da ake ƙara matsayi. Yana amfani da wani motsi na zauren zauren akwatin bayanin akwatin bayani na bayani, don mu ƙayyade wani kima mai nuna-kwamfyuta-kamar shirin cire-shirin nuna wa zauren akwatin bayanin nan da za'a yi amfani da wani motsi na zauren akwatin bayani na daban. Ga masu motsi da aka samu'a, sai mu yi amfani da emballar wani mai ƙidãya na historin-zuwa-jibo da wani mai gabatar da baka-bakin-jawab zuwa yanzu ta sami-yanzu ta ƙara wani mai labanci. Fijaroyi biyu masu popular zauren zauren akwatin bayanin akwatin bayani biyu na buɗe-Domen na nuna cewa Furofati mai kyau na iya ƙiƙiro matsayin akwatin bayani masu ƙarfi, wanda ya gaskata amfani da ya shigar da shi cikin zauren akwatin bayani na kamata.", 'sk': 'Tipični generativni modeli dialogov uporabljajo zgodovino dialogov za ustvarjanje odziva. Ker pa je na eno izjavo dialoga pogosto mogoče ustrezno odgovoriti z več različnimi odgovori, ustvarjanje želenega odziva zgolj na podlagi zgodovinskih informacij ni enostavno. Intuitivno, če lahko chatbot vnaprej predvidi, o čem bi uporabnik govoril (tj. o prihodnosti dialoga), potem ko bi prejel svoj odgovor, bi lahko zagotovil bolj informativen odgovor. V skladu s tem predlagamo nov okvir za generiranje dialoga z imenom ProphetChat, ki uporablja simulirane dialogske prihodnosti v fazi sklepanja za izboljšanje generiranja odzivov. Da bi chatbotu omogočili predvidevanje prihodnosti dialoga, smo oblikovali strategijo uvajanja iskanja žarka za simulacijo dialoga prihodnosti z uporabo tipičnega modela generacije dialoga in izbirnika dialoga. S simuliranimi prihodnostmi nato uporabimo ansambel generatorja zgodovine v odziv in generatorja prihodnosti v odziv, da skupaj ustvarimo bolj informativen odziv. Eksperimenti na dveh priljubljenih naborih podatkov o dialogih z odprto domeno kažejo, da lahko ProphetChat ustvari boljše odzive preko močnih osnovnih linij, kar potrjuje prednosti vključevanja simuliranih prihodnosti dialoga.', 'he': "דוגמני דיאלוג דוריים טיפוסיים משתמשים בהיסטוריה של דיאלוג כדי ליצור את התגובה. עם זאת, מכיוון שדיאלוג אחד לעתים קרובות יכול לענות כראוי על ידי מספר תשובות ברורות, ליצור תגובה רצויה מבוססת רק על המידע היסטורי זה לא קל. באופן אינטואיטיבי, אם הצ'אטבוט יכול לצפות מראש על מה המשתמש ידבר (כלומר, על עתיד הדיולוג) לאחר שקיבל את התגובה שלו, הוא עלול לספק תגובה מידעית יותר. לכן, אנו מציעים מסגרת דואר דיאלוג חדשה בשם ProphetChat שמשתמשת בעתיד הדיולוג הסימולוגי בשלב ההנחה כדי לשפר את דור התגובה. כדי לאפשר לצ'אטבוט לצפות בעתיד הדיולוג, אנחנו מעצבים אסטרטגיה של חיפוש קרן לסימולציה העתידית לדיולוג באמצעות מודל דולר דולר דיאלוג טיפוסי ובחר דיאלוג. עם העתיד הסימולוגי, אנו משתמשים באנסמבל של גנרטור היסטוריה-לתגובה וגנרטור עתיד-לתגובה כדי ליצור יחד תגובה מידעית יותר. ניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים של דיאלוג פתוח פופולריים מראים שProphetChat יכול ליצור תגובות טובות יותר על קווי בסיס חזקים, אשר מאשר את היתרונות של שילוב עתידים הדיולוג הסימולוגי.", 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་མཐུན་སྣང་བྱེད་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་དཔེ་རིགས ཡིན་ནའང་མིན་པར། ཌའི་ལོག་བློ་གཏོང་གཅིག་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ངོ་མ་ཚང་ཁག་གིས་གནད་དོན་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་ལན་གསལ་བ འཆར་བརྩོན་བྱས་ན། གལ་སྲིད་དམ་ཟབ་འདི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ག་ཅི་སྐོར་བཤད་ན་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཐུབ་པ་དང་། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་གསར་བ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་མིང་བརྡ་གཏོང་གི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་མིང་ཞིག་གིས་གསར་གཏོང་གི་གླེང་མོལ་འདི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག To enable the chatbot to foresee the dialog future, we design a beam-search-like roll-out strategy for dialog future simulation using a typical dialog generation model and a dialog selector. མཉམ་སྦྲགས་པའི་མ་འོངས་པར་བེད་སྤྱད་ནས་ང་ཚོས་ལོ་རྒྱུས་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དང་མ་འོངས སྐད་ཆ་གྲངས་ཆེ་བའི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་domain་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་བརྡ་སྟངས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་མིང་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་ནང་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཁ་ཤས'}
{'en': 'Context Matters: A Pragmatic Study of ', 'ar': 'نمذجة الإجابة على السؤال متعدد القفزات كتوقع تسلسل فردي', 'es': 'Modelado de respuestas a preguntas de múltiples saltos como predicción de secuencia', 'fr': 'Modélisation de la réponse aux questions à sauts multiples comme prédiction', 'pt': 'Modelagem de respostas a perguntas de vários saltos como previsão de sequência única', 'ja': '単一シーケンス予測としてのマルチホップクエスチョンアンサーのモデリング', 'zh': '将多跳问答建模为单序占候', 'hi': 'मॉडलिंग मल्टी-हॉप प्रश्न एकल अनुक्रम भविष्यवाणी के रूप में जवाब', 'ru': 'Моделирование многохоповых ответов на вопросы в виде предсказания одной последовательности', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Ceist Ilhop mar Thuar Seicheamh Singil', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών χορού ως πρόβλεψη ενιαίας ακολουθίας', 'hu': 'Multi-hop kérdések megválaszolása egyetlen sorozatos előrejelzésként', 'ka': 'მრავალ- ჰოპის მოდელური კითხვების გადასრულება როგორც ერთი წერტილის წერტილება', 'it': 'Modellazione delle risposte alle domande multi-hop come previsione di singola sequenza', 'kk': 'Көп- хоп сұрақ жауап жауап бір реттік таңдау ретінде үлгілеу', 'lt': 'Modeling Multi-hop Question Answering as Single Sequence Prediction', 'mk': 'Моделирање на одговорите на повеќе прашања како предвидување на една секвенција', 'ms': 'Memodel Jawapan soalan Berlipat-Lompat sebagai Prediksi Sekuensi Satu', 'ml': 'മോഡോളിങ് പല- ഹോപ്പ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഏക സെക്കന്റ് മുന്\u200dഗണനം', 'mt': 'L-immudellar tat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’ħafna ħops bħala tbassir ta’ sekwenza unika', 'mn': 'Олон-хоп асуултуудын загвар нэг дарааллын таамаглал гэж хариулах', 'no': 'Modellerer fleire hopp- spørsmål svar som enkelt rekkefølgje', 'ro': 'Modelarea răspunsurilor la întrebări multi-hop ca predicție de secvență unică', 'si': 'ගොඩක් හොප් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න එකම ක්\u200dරමයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට', 'pl': 'Modelowanie odpowiedzi na pytania wieloohopowe jako prognozowanie pojedynczej sekwencji', 'sv': 'Modellering av flerHoppfrågassvar som förutsägelse av en enda sekvens', 'sr': 'Modeliranje multihopskih pitanja odgovara kao predviđanje jedinstvene sekvence', 'so': "Isku jawaabta su'aalaha badan oo kaliya", 'ur': 'Multi-hop سوال کا جواب ایک سیکئنس کی پیش بینی کے طور پر مدل کیا جاتا ہے', 'ta': 'மாதிரியும் பல- hop கேள்விக்கு பதில் ஒற்றை விகிதமான விகிதம்', 'vi': 'Diễn biến câu hỏi đa hop như mã số tiết kiệm', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Моделиране на отговор на въпроси с няколко скока като прогноза за единична последователност', 'nl': 'Modelleren van het beantwoorden van meerdere hopvragen als Single Sequence Prediction', 'da': 'Modellering Multi-hop spørgsmål besvarelse som enkelt sekvens forudsigelse', 'hr': 'Modeliranje multihopskih pitanja odgovara kao predviđanje jedinstvene sekvence', 'de': 'Modellierung der Multi-Hop-Fragebeantwortung als Single Sequence Prediction', 'id': 'Modeling Multi-hop Pertanyaan Jawaban sebagai Prediksi Sekuensi Satu', 'ko': '단일 시퀀스 예측에 기반한 다중 퀴즈 모델링', 'sw': 'Question Multi-hop Answers as One Sequence Prediction', 'tr': 'Birnäçe-Hop Soragy Tek-Diňe Wasp Görkezilişi', 'af': 'Modeleer Multi-Hop Vrag Antwoord as Enkel Sequence Voorskou', 'fa': 'نمودار سوال چند هپ جواب دادن به عنوان پیش\u200cبینی یک سرعت', 'sq': 'Modelimi i përgjigjeve të pyetjeve me shumë hapa si parashikim i një sekuence', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Մոդելավորել բազմահուսային հարցերի պատասխանը որպես մեկ հաջորդականության կանխատեսում', 'bn': 'মোডেলিং মাল্টি- হোপ প্রশ্নের উত্তর একক সেকেন্সের পছন্দ হিসেবে', 'bs': 'Modeliranje multihopskih pitanja odgovara kao predviđanje jedinstvene sekvence', 'az': 'Çoxlu-Hop soruşu Tək Sıradan Özünün cavabı', 'ca': 'Modeling Multi-hop Question Answering as Single Sequence Prediction', 'cs': 'Modelování odpovědí na více hopové otázky jako predikce jedné sekvence', 'fi': 'Useiden hyppyjen kysymysvastausten mallintaminen yhden sarjan ennusteena', 'et': 'Multi-hop küsimustele vastamise modelleerimine ühe järjestuse prognoosina', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Modeliranje odgovorov na vprašanja z več koraki kot napoved enega zaporedja', 'he': 'דוגמנית תשובות על שאלות רבות-תקופות בתור ציון רצף יחיד', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'bo': 'Modeling Multi-hop Question Answering as Single sequence Prediction'}
{'en': 'In linguistics, there are two main perspectives on negation: a semantic and a pragmatic view. So far, research in NLP on negation has almost exclusively adhered to the semantic view. In this article, we adopt the pragmatic paradigm to conduct a study of negation understanding focusing on transformer-based PLMs. Our results differ from previous, semantics-based studies and therefore help to contribute a more comprehensive – and, given the results, much more optimistic – picture of the PLMs’ negation understanding.', 'ar': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave ، 2020) هو نموذج تجريبي للإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) يستفيد من استرجاع الممر باستخدام محول مُدرَّب مسبقًا ويدفع بأحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية في قفزة واحدة لضمان الجودة. ومع ذلك ، فإن تعقيد ضمان الجودة متعدد القفزات يعيق فعالية نهج ضمان الجودة التوليدي. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نهجًا توليديًا بسيطًا (PathFid) يوسع المهمة إلى ما بعد مجرد توليد الإجابات من خلال نمذجة عملية التفكير بشكل صريح لحل الإجابة على الأسئلة متعددة القفزات. من خلال تحديد مسار التفكير الهرمي للمقاطع الداعمة ، وجملها الأساسية ، وأخيراً الإجابة الواقعية ، نعتبر المشكلة مهمة توقع تسلسل واحد. لتسهيل الاستدلال المعقد باستخدام أدلة متعددة ، نقوم أيضًا بتوسيع التمثيل المسطح الموحد لوثائق الإدخال المتعددة عن طريق تشفير التفاعلات عبر الممرات. توضح تجاربنا المكثفة أن PathFid تؤدي إلى مكاسب قوية في الأداء على مجموعتي بيانات QA متعددي القفزات: HotpotQA و IIRC. إلى جانب مكاسب الأداء ، يعد PathFid أكثر قابلية للتفسير ، والذي بدوره ينتج إجابات أكثر إخلاصًا للمقاطع والحقائق الداعمة مقارنةً بنموذج Fid الأساسي.', 'es': 'Fusion-in-Decoder (Fid) (Izacard y Grave, 2020) es un modelo de respuesta generativa a preguntas (QA) que aprovecha la recuperación de pasajes con un transformador previamente entrenado e impulsa el estado del arte en el control de calidad de un solo salto. Sin embargo, la complejidad del control de calidad multisalto dificulta la eficacia del enfoque de control de calidad generativo. En este trabajo, proponemos un enfoque generativo simple (pathFID) que extiende la tarea más allá de la generación de respuestas al modelar explícitamente el proceso de razonamiento para resolver la respuesta a las preguntas de múltiples saltos. Al linealizar el camino de razonamiento jerárquico de los pasajes de apoyo, sus oraciones clave y, finalmente, la respuesta factoide, presentamos el problema como una tarea de predicción de secuencia única. Para facilitar el razonamiento complejo con múltiples pistas, ampliamos aún más la representación plana unificada de varios documentos de entrada mediante la codificación de interacciones entre pasajes. Nuestros exhaustivos experimentos demuestran que PathFID conduce a importantes mejoras de rendimiento en dos conjuntos de datos de control de calidad multisalto: HotpotQA e IIRC. Además de las mejoras de rendimiento, PathFID es más interpretable, lo que a su vez produce respuestas que se basan más fielmente en los pasajes y hechos de apoyo en comparación con el modelo Fid de referencia.', 'pt': 'O Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard e Grave, 2020) é um modelo generativo de resposta a perguntas (QA) que aproveita a recuperação de passagem com um transformador pré-treinado e impulsionou o estado da arte em QA de salto único. No entanto, a complexidade do QA multi-hop dificulta a eficácia da abordagem QA generativa. Neste trabalho, propomos uma abordagem generativa simples (PathFid) que estende a tarefa além da geração de respostas, modelando explicitamente o processo de raciocínio para resolver a resposta para questões multi-hop. Ao linearizar o caminho de raciocínio hierárquico das passagens de apoio, suas frases-chave e, finalmente, a resposta factóide, lançamos o problema como uma tarefa de previsão de sequência única. Para facilitar o raciocínio complexo com várias pistas, estendemos ainda mais a representação plana unificada de vários documentos de entrada codificando interações de passagem cruzada. Nossos extensos experimentos demonstram que o PathFid leva a fortes ganhos de desempenho em dois conjuntos de dados de controle de qualidade de vários saltos: HotpotQA e IIRC. Além dos ganhos de desempenho, o PathFid é mais interpretável, o que, por sua vez, produz respostas mais fielmente fundamentadas nas passagens e fatos de suporte em comparação com o modelo Fid de linha de base.', 'fr': "Fusion-in-Decoder (Fid) (Izacard et Grave, 2020) est un modèle génératif de réponse aux questions (AQ) qui tire parti de la récupération de passage avec un transformateur pré-entraîné et a poussé l'état de la technique en matière d'assurance qualité à saut unique. Cependant, la complexité de l'assurance qualité multi-sauts entrave l'efficacité de l'approche générative d'assurance qualité. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une approche générative simple (PathFID) qui étend la tâche au-delà de la simple génération de réponses en modélisant explicitement le processus de raisonnement pour résoudre la réponse aux questions à sauts multiples. En linéarisant le chemin de raisonnement hiérarchique des passages annexes, leurs phrases clés et enfin la réponse factoïde, nous présentons le problème comme une tâche de prédiction de séquence unique. Pour faciliter un raisonnement complexe avec de multiples indices, nous étendons encore la représentation plate unifiée de plusieurs documents d'entrée en encodant les interactions entre passages. Nos expériences approfondies démontrent que PathFID permet d'importants gains de performance sur deux ensembles de données d'assurance qualité multi-sauts\xa0: HotPotQA et IIRC. Outre les gains de performance, PathFID est plus interprétable, ce qui permet d'obtenir des réponses plus fidèlement fondées sur les passages et les faits à l'appui que le modèle Fid de référence.", 'ja': 'フュージョンインデコーダ（ Ｆｉｄ ） （ Ｉｚａｃａｒｄ ａｎｄ Ｇｒａｖｅ ， ２ ０ ２ ０ ）は、事前に訓練された変圧器を用いた通路検索を活用し、シングルホップＱ Ａで最先端を押し進める、生成式質問応答（ Ｑ Ａ ）モデルである。 しかし、マルチホップQAの複雑さは、生成QAアプローチの有効性を妨げる。 この研究では、マルチホップの質問に対する答えを解決するために推論プロセスを明示的にモデル化することによって、単なる回答生成を超えてタスクを拡張する単純な生成アプローチ（ PathFid ）を提案します。 階層的な推論経路を直線化することで、パッセージやその主要な文章、そして最後に事実的な答えをサポートすることで、問題を単一のシーケンス予測タスクとしてキャストします。 複数の手がかりを用いた複雑な推論を容易にするために、クロスパスインタラクションを符号化することによって、複数の入力ドキュメントの統一されたフラット表現をさらに拡張します。 当社の広範な実験は、PathFidがHotpotQAとIIRCという2つのマルチホップQAデータセットの強力なパフォーマンス向上につながることを示しています。 パフォーマンスの向上に加えて、PathFidはより解釈可能であり、ベースラインフィッドモデルと比較して、サポートするパッセージと事実により忠実に基づいた回答が得られます。', 'zh': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) 者,生成式问答 (QA) 形也,因豫练转换器通道检索,推先进之术于单跳 QA 。 然多级跳 QA 之复杂性阻生 QA 之有效性。 凡此诸事,立简成(PathFid),以显式建模理决多故,而广其事于答案之外。 因线性化支段落之分理,其要句,最后事实,以为单占。 为便于用数线杂推,编码跨道交广文档者一平面。 博实验明,PathFid 两多跳 QA 数集(HotpotQA 与 IIRC)上致劲擢。 自性能升擢之外,PathFid犹更具可解释性,比之基线Fid模形,其所对益忠实段落事实。', 'hi': 'फ्यूजन-इन-डिकोडर (फिड) (इजाकार्ड और ग्रेव, 2020) एक जेनरेटिव प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) मॉडल है जो एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफार्मर के साथ मार्ग पुनर्प्राप्ति का लाभ उठाता है और एकल-हॉप क्यूए पर कला की स्थिति को धक्का देता है। हालांकि, मल्टी-हॉप क्यूए की जटिलता उत्पादक क्यूए दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता में बाधा डालती है। इस काम में, हम एक सरल उत्पादक दृष्टिकोण (PathFid) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो बहु-हॉप प्रश्नों के उत्तर को हल करने के लिए स्पष्ट रूप से तर्क प्रक्रिया को मॉडलिंग करके केवल उत्तर पीढ़ी से परे कार्य का विस्तार करता है। मार्गों का समर्थन करने के पदानुक्रमित तर्क पथ को रैखिक करके, उनके प्रमुख वाक्य, और अंत में तथ्यात्मक उत्तर, हमने समस्या को एक एकल अनुक्रम पूर्वानुमान कार्य के रूप में डाला। कई सुरागों के साथ जटिल तर्क को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए, हम क्रॉस-पैसेज इंटरैक्शन को एन्कोडिंग करके कई इनपुट दस्तावेज़ों के एकीकृत फ्लैट प्रतिनिधित्व का विस्तार करते हैं। हमारे व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि PathFid दो बहु-हॉप क्यूए डेटासेट पर मजबूत प्रदर्शन लाभ की ओर जाता है: HotpotQA और IIRC। प्रदर्शन लाभ के अलावा, PathFid अधिक व्याख्या योग्य है, जो बदले में उन उत्तरों को उत्पन्न करता है जो बेसलाइन फिड मॉडल की तुलना में सहायक मार्ग और तथ्यों के लिए अधिक ईमानदारी से आधारित होते हैं।', 'ru': 'Fusion-in-decoder (FID) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) - это генеративная модель ответа на вопросы (QA), которая использует извлечение прохождения с помощью предварительно обученного трансформатора и продвигает современный уровень на однохоповом QA. Тем не менее, сложность многохопового QA препятствует эффективности генеративного подхода QA. В этой работе мы предлагаем простой генеративный подход (PathFid), который расширяет задачу за пределы простого генерации ответов, явно моделируя процесс рассуждений для решения ответов на многохоповые вопросы. Линеаризуя иерархический путь рассуждений поддерживающих отрывков, их ключевых предложений и, наконец, фактоидного ответа, мы ставим задачу как задачу предсказания одной последовательности. Чтобы облегчить сложное рассуждение с несколькими подсказками, мы дополнительно расширяем унифицированное плоское представление нескольких входных документов путем кодирования перекрестных взаимодействий. Наши обширные эксперименты показывают, что PathFid приводит к значительному повышению производительности на двух множественных наборах данных QA: HotpotQA и IIRC. Помимо повышения производительности, PathFid является более интерпретируемым, что, в свою очередь, дает ответы, которые более точно основаны на подтверждающих отрывках и фактах по сравнению с базовой моделью FID.', 'ga': 'Múnla ginideach freagartha ceisteanna (QA) is ea Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) a ghiarálann aisghabháil pasáiste le claochladán réamhoilte agus a bhrúigh an úrscothacht ar QA aon hop. Mar sin féin, cuireann castacht an QA il-hop bac ar éifeachtacht an chur chuige giniúna QA. San obair seo, molaimid cur chuige giniúna simplí (PathFid) a leathnaíonn an tasc níos faide ná giniúint freagraí amháin tríd an bpróiseas réasúnaíochta a shamhaltú go sainráite chun an freagra ar cheisteanna il-hop a réiteach. Trí chosán réasúnaíochta ordlathach na sleachta tacaíochta a líneáil, na príomh-abairtí a bhaineann leo, agus ar deireadh an freagra factoideach, chaitheamar an fhadhb mar thasc amháin chun seicheamh a thuar. Chun réasúnaíocht chasta le leideanna iolracha a éascú, déanaimid leathnú breise ar an léiriú comhréidh aontaithe ar dhoiciméid ionchuir iolracha trí idirghníomhaíochtaí tras-pasáiste a ionchódú. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh fhairsing go bhfuil gnóthachain feidhmíochta láidre mar thoradh ar PathFid ar dhá thacar sonraí il-hop QA: HotpotQA agus IIRC. Seachas na gnóthachain feidhmíochta, tá PathFid níos inmhínithe, rud a thugann freagraí atá bunaithe níos dílis ar na sleachta agus na fíricí tacaíochta i gcomparáid leis an tsamhail bhunlíne Fid.', 'ka': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) არის გენერაციური კითხვის პასუხი (QA) მოდელია, რომელიც წინასწარმოადგილებული ტრანფორმენტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრისტრი მაგრამ, მრავალ-ჰოპ QA-ის კომპლექსიტება შეუძლებელია წარმოიდგინეთ QA პროგრამის ეფექტიურობას. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მხოლოდ გენერაციური პროცესი (PathFid), რომელიც მხოლოდ განსხვავების შემდეგ მხოლოდ განსხვავების შემდეგ პარამენტის პროცესის მარტილურად მოდელურად გავამუშავებთ პრობლემას, საკუთარი ფაქტოდის პასუხი, ჩვენ პრობლემა როგორც ერთი წინაწერების წინაწერების მომხმარების მიხედვით. შესაძლებელია კომპლექსიკური პარამენტის გახსნა, ჩვენ უფრო ერთადერთად გახსნა მრავალური გახსნა დოკუმენტის გახსნა კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციაზე. ჩვენი განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ PathFid იმის ძალიან კონფიგურაციას გავიღებს ორი მრავალ-ჰოპ QA მონაცემენტები: HotpotQA და IIRC. პროცექტის შესახებ, PathFid უფრო ძალიან განსხვავებელია, რომელიც მიიღება პასუხი, რომელიც უფრო გრძნობელია, რომელიც უფრო გრძნობელია დამხმარებელი პროცექტის და ფაქტის შესა', 'el': 'Ο σύντηξη-σε-αποκωδικοποιητής (Φιντ) (Ιζάκαρντ και Γκρέιβ, 2020) είναι ένα μοντέλο που χρησιμοποιεί την ανάκτηση περάσεων με έναν προ-εκπαιδευμένο μετασχηματιστή και ώθησε την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας για την QA ενός χορού. Ωστόσο, η πολυπλοκότητα της QS με πολλαπλά άλματα εμποδίζει την αποτελεσματικότητα της παραγωγικής προσέγγισης QS. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια απλή παραγωγική προσέγγιση (που επεκτείνει το έργο πέρα από την απλή δημιουργία απαντήσεων μοντελοποιώντας ρητά τη διαδικασία συλλογισμού για την επίλυση της απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών χορού. Με τη γραμμοποίηση της ιεραρχικής λογικής διαδρομής των υποστηρικτικών αποσπασμάτων, των βασικών προτάσεων τους και τέλος της πραγματικής απάντησης, θέτουμε το πρόβλημα ως μια ενιαία εργασία πρόβλεψης ακολουθίας. Για να διευκολύνουμε την πολύπλοκη συλλογιστική με πολλαπλά στοιχεία, επεκτείνουμε περαιτέρω την ενοποιημένη επίπεδη αναπαράσταση των πολλαπλών εγγράφων εισόδου κωδικοποιώντας αλληλεπιδράσεις διασταυρούμενων περάσεων. Τα εκτεταμένα πειράματά μας αποδεικνύουν ότι το PathFid οδηγεί σε ισχυρά κέρδη απόδοσης σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων QA πολλαπλών Hops: HotpotQA και IIRC. Εκτός από τα κέρδη απόδοσης, το PathFid είναι πιο ερμηνευτό, γεγονός που με τη σειρά του δίνει απαντήσεις που είναι πιο πιστά θεμελιωμένες στα υποστηρικτικά αποσπάσματα και τα γεγονότα σε σύγκριση με το βασικό μοντέλο Fid.', 'hu': 'A Fusion-in-dekóder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) egy generációs kérdésre válaszoló (QA) modell, amely egy előre kiképzett transzformátorral használja az áthaladást, és a legkorszerűbb technológiát erősíti a single-hop QA-n. A multi-hop minőségbiztosítás összetettsége azonban akadályozza a generációs minőségbiztosítási megközelítés hatékonyságát. Ebben a munkában egy egyszerű generációs megközelítést (PathFid) javasolunk, amely kiterjeszti a feladatot a válasz generálásán túl, kifejezetten modellezve az érvelési folyamatot a multi-hop kérdések megoldására. A támogató szakaszok hierarchikus érvelési pályájának linearizálásával, kulcsmondataik és végül a tényleges válasz, a problémát egyetlen szekvencia előrejelzési feladatként vetjük. Annak érdekében, hogy megkönnyítsük a komplex érvelést több nyomra, tovább bővítjük a több bemeneti dokumentum egységes sík ábrázolását, kódolva átjárók közötti interakciókat. Kiterjedt kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a PathFid két multi-hop minőségi adathalmaz esetében jelentős teljesítménynövekedést eredményez: HotpotQA és IIRC. A teljesítménynövekedés mellett a PathFid értelmezhetőbb, ami viszont olyan válaszokat ad, amelyek hűségesebben alapulnak a támogató részekhez és tényekhez, mint az alapvető Fid modell.', 'it': "Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) è un modello generativo di risposta alle domande (QA) che sfrutta il recupero dei passaggi con un trasformatore pre-addestrato e ha spinto lo stato dell'arte sul QA single-hop. Tuttavia, la complessità della qualità multi-hop ostacola l'efficacia dell'approccio generativo della qualità. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un semplice approccio generativo (PathFid) che estende il compito oltre la semplice generazione di risposte modellando esplicitamente il processo di ragionamento per risolvere la risposta alle domande multi-hop. Linearizzando il percorso di ragionamento gerarchico dei passaggi di supporto, le loro frasi chiave e infine la risposta effettiva, abbiamo gettato il problema come un compito di previsione di sequenza singola. Per facilitare il ragionamento complesso con più indizi, estendiamo ulteriormente la rappresentazione unificata piatta di più documenti di input codificando interazioni cross-passage. I nostri estesi esperimenti dimostrano che PathFid porta a forti guadagni di prestazioni su due set di dati QA multi-hop: HotpotQA e IIRC. Oltre ai guadagni di performance, PathFid è più interpretabile, che a sua volta fornisce risposte che sono più fedelmente basate sui passaggi e fatti di supporto rispetto al modello Fid di base.", 'lt': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard ir Grave, 2020 m.) – tai generacinis klausimų atsakymo model is, kuris skatina perėjimo atgavimą su iš anksto apmokytu transformatoriumi ir skatina pažangiausią pažangą vieno hopo QA srityje. Tačiau daugelio apynių QA sudėtingumas trukdo veiksmingai taikyti kartotinį QA metodą. Šiame darbe siūlome paprastą kartos metodą (PathFid), kuriuo užduotis išplečiama ne tik atsakymų generacijai, bet ir aiškiai modeliuojant motyvavimo procesą, kad būtų išspręstas atsakymas į daugialypius klausimus. Liniarizuodami hierarchinį pagrindimo kelią palaikomosioms dalims, jų pagrindiniams sakiniams ir galiausiai faktiniam atsakymui, mes iškeliame problem ą kaip vieną sekos prognozavimo užduotį. Siekiant palengvinti sudėtingą pagrįstumą keliais požymiais, toliau plėsime vieningą vienodą daugelio įvestų dokumentų atstovavimą koduojant tarpusavio sąveiką. Mūsų ekstensyvūs eksperimentai rodo, kad PathFid sukuria didelį rezultatų padidėjimą dviejuose daugiapakopiuose QA duomenų rinkiniuose: HotpotQA ir IIRC. Be veiklos rezultatų padidėjimo, PathFid yra aiškinamas, o tai savo ruožtu suteikia atsakymus, kurie yra patikimesni pagrįsti patvirtinamaisiais dalykais ir faktais, palyginti su pradiniu Fid modeliu.', 'mk': 'Фузија-во-декодер (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) е генерационален модел на одговор на прашања (QA) кој влијае на преземањето на преминот со претрениран трансформатор и го притиска најдобриот технички степен на едно-хоп QA. Сепак, комплексноста на мултихоп QA ја попречува ефикасноста на генеративниот пристап QA. In this work, we propose a simple generative approach (PathFid) that extends the task beyond just answer generation by explicitly modeling the reasoning process to resolve the answer for multi-hop questions.  Со линијализирање на хиерархичниот пат на размислување на поддржувањето на премините, нивните клучни реченици, и конечно фактоидниот одговор, го фрлиме проблемот како единствена задача за предвидување на секвенцијата. За да го олесниме комплексното размислување со повеќе траги, понатаму го прошируваме единственото рамно претставување на повеќето внесени документи со кодирање на интеракциите преку преминот. Нашите експерименти демонстрираат дека PathFid води до силни постигнувања на резултатите на двата мнозински податоци за QA: HotpotQA и IIRC. Покрај постигнувањата на перформансата, PathFid е поинтерпретабилен, што од своја страна дава одговори кои се поверно основани на поддржувачките премини и факти во споредба со основниот модел Fid.', 'ml': 'ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d - in- decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത് ക്യൂഎ) മോഡലാണ്. ഒരു മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനിര്\u200dമ്മാണിക്കുന്നത് ക്യൂഎയിലെ കലാകാരത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥി എന്നാലും പല-ഹോപ്പ് ക്യൂഎയുടെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണത്തിന്റെ സാധ്യത തടഞ്ഞു നിര്\u200dത്തുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ലളിതമായ ജനററിവേറ്റീവ് നടപടിയാണ് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നത്. അത് മറുപടി തലമുറയിലേക്കുള്ള ജോലി വിശാലമാക്കുന്നു. പല-ഹോ അടയാളവാക്കുകളെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d കാരണങ്ങളുടെ പാത പാത പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വഴിയും, അവസാനം ഫാക്ടോയ പല ക്ലൂട്ടുകളുമായി കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഫ്ലാറ്റ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ക നമ്മുടെ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പാത്ത്\u200cഫിഡ് രണ്ട് പലഹോപ്പ് ക്യൂഎ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലേക്ക് ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രദര്\u200dശനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നയ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ സമ്പാദം കൂടാതെ, പാത്ത്\u200cഫിഡ് കൂടുതല്\u200d വ്യാഖ്യാനിക്കുന്നതാണ്, അതിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള മറുപടികള്\u200dക്ക് വിശ്വസ്തതയോടെ പി', 'mt': 'Id-dekoder tal-fużjoni (Fid) (Izacard u Grave, 2020) huwa mudell ġenerattiv li jwieġeb għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) li jagħti spinta lill-irkupru tal-passaġġ bi trasformatur imħarreġ minn qabel u jimbotta l-aktar avvanzat fuq il-QA ta’ hop wieħed. Madankollu, il-kumplessità tal-QA b’ħafna ħops tfixkel l-effettività tal-approċċ ġenerattiv tal-QA. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu approċċ ġenerattiv sempliċi (PathFid) li jestendi l-kompitu lil hinn mill-ġenerazzjoni ta’ tweġibiet sempliċi billi nimmudellaw b’mod espliċitu l-proċess ta’ raġunament biex jissolvew it-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’ħafna punti. Billi nillinjalizzaw it-triq ta’ raġunament ġerarkiku ta’ appoġġ għall-passaġġi, is-sentenzi ewlenin tagħhom, u fl-a ħħar nett it-tweġiba fattojde, aħna nieħdu l-problem a bħala kompitu wieħed ta’ tbassir tas-sekwenza. To facilitate complex reasoning with multiple clues, we further extend the unified flat representation of multiple input documents by encoding cross-passage interactions.  L-esperimenti estensivi tagħna juru li PathFid iwassal għal kisbiet qawwija fil-prestazzjoni fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta QA b’ħafna ħops: HotpotQA u IIRC. Minbarra l-kisbiet fil-prestazzjoni, PathFid huwa aktar interpretabbli, li min-naħa tiegħu jagħti tweġibiet li huma bbażati b’mod aktar fedeli fuq il-passaġġi u l-fatti ta’ appoġġ meta mqabbel mal-mudell Fid tal-linja bażi.', 'kk': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) деген сұрақ жауап беру үлгісі (QA) үлгісі, бұл өзгертілген түрлендірушімен пассажаларды алу үлгісін көмектеседі және бір-хоп QA күйіне жұмыс күйін бастады. Бірақ, көп-хоп QA-ның кәдімгілігі QA-ның жасалған әдімгінің эффектілігін бұғаттайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз көп-хоп сұрақтарының жауабын шешу үшін, тапсырманы жауапты жасауға арналған қарапайым генерациялық тәсілді (PathFid) ұсынамыз. Пассажаларды, түрлі сөйлемелерін және соңында фактоидтердің жауабын түрлендіріп, мәселеді бір реттік таңдау тапсырмасы ретінде жібереміз. Комплекс сезімдерді бірнеше клубмен көмектесу үшін бірнеше келтірілген құжаттарды көмектесу арқылы кодтамыз. Біздің кеңейтілген тәжірибеміз PathFid екі көп-хоп QA деректер қорларында күшті жұмыс жеткізетінін көрсетеді: HotpotQA және IIRC. PathFid жылдамдығын жетілдіру арқылы, оның негізгі Fid үлгісіне салыстырып, қолдау үлгілеріне және шындықтардың негізгі үлгісіне сәйкес қолдау үлгілеріне арналған жауаптарын береді.', 'ms': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) adalah model yang menjawab soalan generatif (QA) yang menggunakan pengumpulan laluan dengan pengubah yang dilatih dahulu dan mendorong state of the art pada single-hop QA. Namun, kompleksiti QA multi-hop menghalangi kegunaan pendekatan QA generatif. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan generatif mudah (PathFid) yang memperluas tugas melampaui generasi jawapan sahaja dengan menjelaskan model proses alasan untuk menyelesaikan jawapan untuk soalan berbilang-hop. Dengan linearisasi laluan pemikiran hierarkis untuk menyokong laluan, kalimat kunci mereka, dan akhirnya jawapan faktoid, kita melemparkan masalah sebagai tugas ramalan urutan tunggal. Untuk memudahkan pemahaman kompleks dengan petunjuk berbilang, kita lebih lanjutkan perwakilan rata bersatu dokumen input berbilang dengan mengekodkan interaksi salib-laluan. Eksperimen ekstensif kami menunjukkan bahawa PathFid membawa kepada keuntungan prestasi yang kuat pada dua set data QA multi-hop: HotpotQA dan IIRC. Selain peningkatan prestasi, PathFid lebih boleh diterangkan, yang menurutnya memberikan jawapan yang lebih setia berdasarkan pasangan dan fakta sokongan dibandingkan dengan model Fid dasar.', 'mn': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) гэдэг бол асуулт хариулт (QA) загвар юм. Энэ нь өмнө сургалтын шилжүүлэгч болон урлагийн байдлыг нэг холбооны QA-д хүргэж чадна. Гэхдээ олон холбоотой QA-ын төвөгтэй цогцол нь үүсгэн QA-ын үйлдвэрлэлийн үр дүнг зогсоож байна. Энэ ажил дээр бид олон холбоотой асуултуудын хариултыг шийдэх боломжтой арга загварыг тодорхой загварчлах боломжтой энгийн үйлдвэрлэлийн арга загварыг (PathFid) дэвшүүлдэг. Тэдний хамгийн чухал өгүүлбэр, эцэст нь фактоидын хариултыг шугамнаар бид асуудлыг нэг дарааллын таамаглалтын ажил болгосон. Бид олон тооны холбоотой комплекс ойлголтыг амжилттай болгохын тулд олон орноос бичсэн баримтуудын нэгтгэл харилцааныг кодлохын тулд нэмэгдүүлнэ. Манай өргөн туршилтууд PathFid-г хоёр олон хоногийн QA өгөгдлийн санд хүчтэй ажиллагаанд хүргэж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг. Ажиллалтын ялгаагаас гадна PathFid илүү ойлгомжтой байдаг. Энэ нь үндсэн Fid загвартай харьцуулахад илүү үнэндээ дэмжиж буй загварууд болон үнэндээ илүү итгэлтэй байдаг.', 'pl': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) to model generatywnego odpowiedzi na pytania (QA), który wykorzystuje odzyskiwanie przejść za pomocą wstępnie przeszkolonego transformatora i wprowadził najnowocześniejszy stan techniki w zakresie jednoosobowej jakości. Jednak złożoność multi-hop QA utrudnia skuteczność podejścia generatywnego QA. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy proste podejście generatywne (PathFid), które rozszerza zadanie poza tylko generowanie odpowiedzi poprzez wyraźne modelowanie procesu rozumowania w celu rozwiązania odpowiedzi na pytania multi-hop. Liniaryzując hierarchiczną ścieżkę rozumowania fragmentów wspierających, ich kluczowe zdania i wreszcie faktyczną odpowiedź, postawiliśmy problem jako pojedyncze zadanie przewidywania sekwencji. Aby ułatwić złożone rozumowanie przy użyciu wielu wskazówek, dodatkowo rozszerzamy ujednoliconą płaską reprezentację wielu dokumentów wejściowych poprzez kodowanie interakcji krzyżowych. Nasze szerokie eksperymenty pokazują, że PathFid prowadzi do dużych wzrostów wydajności dwóch zestawów danych dotyczących jakości wielu chmur: HotpotQA i IIRC. Oprócz wzrostów wydajności PathFid jest bardziej interpretowalny, co z kolei daje odpowiedzi, które są bardziej wiernie uzasadnione dla wspierających fragmentów i faktów w porównaniu z podstawowym modelem Fid.', 'sr': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izakard i Grave, 2020) je generični model odgovora na pitanje (QA) koji utiče na povratak prolaza sa predobučenim transformatorom i gura stanje umetnosti na jednohopski QA. Međutim, kompleksnost multihopa QA sprječava učinkovitost generativnog QA pristupa. U ovom poslu predlažemo jednostavan generativni pristup (PathFid), koji proširi zadatak izvan generacije odgovora, isključivo modelirajući razumni proces da reši odgovor na multihopske pitanja. Linerizirajući hijerarhički razumni put podrške prolaza, njihove ključne rečenice, i konačno faktoidni odgovor, bacili smo problem kao jedini zadatak predviđanja sekvence. Da bi olakšali kompleksno razmišljanje sa višestrukim tragovima, dalje proširimo jedinstvenu ravnu predstavu višestrukih ulaznih dokumenta kodiranjem interakcija preko prolaza. Naši široki eksperimenti pokazuju da PathFid vodi do jakih uspeha na dve multihopske QA podatke: HotpotQA i IIRC. Osim dobitka izvedbe, PathFid je interpretabilniji, što, u turn, daje odgovore koje su vjernije temeljnije na podrške prolaza i činjenice u usporedbi sa osnovnim modelom Fid.', 'ro': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard și Grave, 2020) este un model generativ de răspuns la întrebări (QA), care valorifică recuperarea pasajelor cu un transformator pre-antrenat și a împins starea de ultimă oră pe QA single-hop. Cu toate acestea, complexitatea calității multi-hop împiedică eficacitatea abordării generative a calității. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare generativă simplă (PathFid) care extinde sarcina dincolo de generarea de răspunsuri prin modelarea explicită a procesului de raționament pentru a rezolva răspunsul la întrebările multi-hop. Liniarizând calea ierarhică de raționament a pasajelor de susținere, propozițiile cheie ale acestora și, în cele din urmă, răspunsul factoid, am aruncat problema ca o singură sarcină de predicție a secvenței. Pentru a facilita raționamentul complex cu mai multe indicii, extindem în continuare reprezentarea uniformă a mai multor documente de intrare prin codificarea interacțiunilor transversale. Experimentele noastre extinse demonstrează că PathFid duce la câștiguri puternice de performanță pe două seturi de date QA multi-hop: HotpotQA și IIRC. Pe lângă câștigurile de performanță, PathFid este mai interpretabil, ceea ce, la rândul său, oferă răspunsuri care sunt mai fidel bazate pe pasajele și faptele susținătoare comparativ cu modelul Fid de bază.', 'no': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) er ein generelt spørsmål-svar (QA) model som leverer passasjon til henting med ein føretrained transformator og trykker statusen til kunsten på enkelhopp QA. Kompleksiteten av fleirhopp QA hindrar likevel effektiviteten av den genererte QA-tilnærminga. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein enkel genereringstilnærming (PathFid), som utvidar oppgåva enn berre svargenerasjon ved å modelere uttrykk prosessen for å løyse svaret på fleirhopp spørsmål. Ved å linearisera den hierarkiske årsakende banen til å støtta passager, nøkkelsetningane sine, og til slutt fektoidsvaren, kastar vi problemet som ei enkelt førehandsvising. For å letta komplekse rasjon med fleire kluser, utvidar vi meir den einaste flate representasjonen av fleire inndatadokument ved å koda interaksjonar med cross-passage. Våre utvidende eksperimenter demonstrarer at PathFid fører til sterke utviklingar på to fleirhopp QA-datasett: HotpotQA og IIRC. I tillegg til utviklinga er PathFid meir tolkbare, som tilsvarar svar som er meir tiltrudig grunnlagt til støttande passasjonar og faktane sammenlignet med baseline Fid-modellen.', 'so': "Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) waa jawaabta su'aal geneeral ah (QA) oo bixinaya sameynta baasaboor oo ku wareejinaya bedelka horay loo tababaray oo ku tuuray xaalada farshaxanka oo kaliya QA. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qallafsanaanta QA waxay ka hor jeedisaa saamaynta qaababka QA ee geneeral ah. In this work, we propose a simple generative approach (PathFid) that extends the task beyond just answer generation by explicitly modeling the reasoning process to resolve the answer for multi-hop questions.  Sida aan ku sawiranno waddada hierarkiisa sababta ah ee kaalmeynta baasaboorada, fursadooda furan, ugu danbayna waxaynu dhibaatada u tuuraynaa wax la sii sheego oo kaliya. Si aan u fududayno sababta complex ah oo aad ku leedahay alaabta kala duduwan, waxaynu sii kordhinaynaa wadanka guriga ee la mid dhigay ee dukumentiyada input kala duduwan marka lagu koobi karo iskutallaabta korsashada. Imtixaankayada dheer waxay caddaysaa in PathFid uu ku hoggaamiyo faa'iido xoog leh oo ka soo baxa labada xafiiska QA-da oo badan: HotpotQA iyo IIRC. Dhaqaalaha sameynta waxaa ka sokow in PathFid lagu turjumo, taas oo ku soo jeedaa jawaabo si aamin ah loo dhigay baasaboorada caawimaadda iyo xaqiiqyada la barbaranayo sameynta sameynta qoraalka qoriga ah.", 'sv': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard och Grave, 2020) är en generativ frågesvarsmodell (QA) som utnyttjar passagehämtning med en förklädd transformator och driver det senaste inom single-hop QA. Komplexiteten hos kvalitetssäkring i flera hop hindrar dock effektiviteten i den generativa kvalitetssäkringsmetoden. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett enkelt generativt tillvägagångssätt (PathFid) som utökar uppgiften bortom bara svarsgenerering genom att uttryckligen modellera resonemanget för att lösa svaret på multi-hop frågor. Genom att linjärisera den hierarkiska resonemangsvägen för att stödja passager, deras nyckelmeningar och slutligen det faktiska svaret, kastar vi problemet som en enda sekvensförutsägelseuppgift. För att underlätta komplicerat resonemang med flera ledtrådar utökar vi ytterligare den enhetliga platta representationen av flera indata dokument genom att koda korsgående interaktioner. Våra omfattande experiment visar att PathFid leder till starka prestationsvinster på två multi-hop QA dataset: HotpotQA och IIRC. Förutom prestationsvinsterna är PathFid mer tolkningsbar, vilket i sin tur ger svar som är mer trogna till de stödjande passagerna och fakta jämfört med baseline Fid modellen.', 'si': 'Fuction-in-decoder (Fid) (Issacrd and Grave, 2020යි) ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් (QA) මදුල්යෙක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපකයෙක් සමග ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක නමුත්, වැඩි හොප් QA ගේ සංකල්පතාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක QA විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙන්න පුළුව මේ වැඩේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (pathFid) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අන්තිමේදී ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ. ගොඩක් සංකේතය සඳහා සංකේතය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාධාරණය කරන්න, අපි තවමත් සංකේතයෙන් ඇතුළු ලිපිණිය ගොඩක් සංකේතය ප අපේ විශාල පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ pathFid විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ගොඩක් හොප් QA දත්ත සේට් දෙකට: HotpotQA ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින්, pathFid විසින් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසින් විශ', 'ta': 'முகப்பு- in- decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) என்பது ஒரு பொதுவான கேள்வி பதில் (QA) மாதிரியாகும் போது, ஒரு முன் பயிற்சி மாற்றி மற்றும் ஒரு ஒற்றை கியூஏ மீது கலைப்பு நிலையை  இருந்தாலும், பல- hop QA சிக்கல்களின் சிக்கல் In this work, we propose a simple generative approach (PathFid) that extends the task beyond just answer generation by explicitly modeling the reasoning process to resolve the answer for multi-hop questions.  கடவுச்சொல்களை ஆதரிக்கும் முனைய காரணங்களின் பாதையை வரிசைப்படுத்துவதற்காக, அவர்களுடைய விசை வாக்கியங்கள் மற்றும் இறுதியாக காரணி விடை  பல குறுக்குகளுடன் சிக்கலான காரணங்களை உபயோகிக்க, நாம் மேலும் ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பல உள்ளீட்டு ஆவணங்களின் ஒத் எங்கள் விரிவான சோதனைகள் பாத்பிட் இரண்டு பல- hop கியூஏ தரவுத்தளங்களில் வலிமையான செயல்பாடு வெற்றி செலுத்துகிறது என்பதை காட்டு செயல்பாட்டு வெற்றி தவிர, பாத்பிட் மிகவும் விளக்கமாக இருக்கும், அது மாற்றியமைக்கும் பதில் அடிப்படைக்கோடு பிட் மாதிரியை ஒப்பிடும் போத', 'ur': "Fusion-in-decoder However, multi-hop QA's complexity hinders the efficiency of the generative QA approach. اس کام میں ہم ایک ساده پیدا کرنے والی تقریبا (PathFid) کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو صرف جواب کی نسل کے بعد کام کو اضافہ کرتا ہے، مفصل پرسس کو مضبوط طریقہ سے موجود کرتا ہے کہ multi-hop سوال کے جواب حل کرے۔ مسافروں کی مدد کرنے کے لئے، ان کی کلیدی جماعتیں، اور بالآخر فاکتوئیڈ جواب کے لئے، ہم نے مسئلہ کو ایک طریقہ پیش بینی کا کام بنایا ہے. بہت سی کلاس کے ساتھ پیچیدہ منطقی کی آسانی کرنے کے لئے، ہم اس سے بڑھ کر بہت سی اینٹ ڈیکومٹ کے متعدد منطقی منطقی کریں ہمارے گھیرے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ PathFid دو multi-hop QA ڈاٹ سٹ پر مضبوط کامپیوتر کا فائدہ پہنچاتا ہے: HotpotQA اور IIRC۔ فارغ کامیابی کے علاوہ PathFid بہت زیادہ تفصیل دینے والا ہے، اور اس کے علاوہ جواب دیتا ہے جو زیادہ یقین رکھنے والی مسافروں اور حقیقتوں کے ذریعہ بنیاد لین Fid موڈل کے مقابلہ میں زیادہ پائیدار ہیں.", 'vi': '"Fusion-in-decer (Fid) (Izacard and Graves, 2020) là một câu hỏi hệ thống trả lời (QA) mô hình dùng máy phục hồi hành lang với một bộ chuyển hóa được huấn luyện trước và thúc đẩy trạng thái nghệ thuật trên kênh QA độc lập. Tuy nhiên, tính phức tạp của QA đa hop gây cản trở hiệu quả của giải QA hệ quả. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp sinh sản đơn giản (Pattind) giúp nỗ lực vượt xa khả năng tạo ra các câu trả lời bằng cách mô tả rõ ràng quy trình lập luận để giải quyết các câu trả lời cho các câu hỏi đa khoa. Bằng việc xếp hình lối dẫn lập trình phân cấp của các đoạn hỗ trợ, các câu chính của họ, và cuối cùng là câu trả lời Factionless, chúng tôi phân vai trò tiên đoán dãy số một. Để dễ dàng lập luận phức tạp với nhiều manh mối, chúng tôi còn mở rộng sự đại diện đơn giản của nhiều tài liệu nhập bằng cách mã hóa các tương tác xuyên qua. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng Pathi có hiệu suất tăng mạnh trên hai nhà chứa đa hop QA: HotpotQA và lRC. Ngoại trừ khả năng đạt được, Pathi sẽ dễ hiểu hơn, và sẽ cung cấp những câu trả lời dựa trên sự kiện và các đoạn hỗ trợ hơn so với mô hình nền fid.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, ko'pqop QA'ning murakkablarini umumiy QA usulining effektini bajaradi. Bu vazifanda, biz oddiy generativ usulni (PathFid) rivojlanamiz, bu vazifani faqat javob yaratishdan keyin javob yaratadi va ko'plab-hop savollariga javob chiqarish uchun juda ko'proq holatni ko'rsatish uchun javob beradi. Maxfiy soʻzlarni qoʻllash uchun hierarchik sabablar yoʻlini qoʻllash uchun, kalit so'zlarining maxfiy soʻzlarini, va oxirida faqqiy javob beradi, biz muammolani bir xil oldinga vazifa deb o'ylaymiz. Koʻproq qatlamlar bilan murakkab sababni foydalanish uchun biz bir nechta kiritish hujjatning bir nechta qoʻshish uchun bir nechta qoʻshish uchun bir nechta qoʻshish uchun bir nechta qoʻllanmagan flat representiyasini oshirimiz. Bizning kengaytmalar PathFid ikki ko'pkop QA maʼlumotlar tartiblarini ko'rsatadi. HotpotQA va IIRC. Va bajarish natijalari bilan PathFid juda ko'proq tarjima qilishi mumkin. Bu natijada asosiy maxfiy soʻzlarni qoʻllashga qoʻllanilgan va asosiy modeliga kamaytirilgan narsalarning javob beradi.", 'bg': 'Фюжън-в-декодер (Изакард и Грейв, 2020) е генеративен модел за отговор на въпроси (QA), който използва извличането на преходи с предварително обучен трансформатор и тласка най-съвременните технологии при едно-хоп QA. Въпреки това сложността на многохоповото ОК възпрепятства ефективността на генеративния подход за ОК. В тази работа предлагаме прост генеративен подход (който разширява задачата отвъд просто генериране на отговори чрез изрично моделиране на процеса на разсъждаване за решаване на отговора на въпроси от мулти-хоп. Чрез линейнизиране на йерархичния път на разсъждението на поддържащите пасажи, ключовите им изречения и накрая фактоидния отговор, ние хвърляме проблема като задача за предсказване на една последователност. За да улесним сложното разсъждение с множество улики, ние допълнително разширяваме единното плоско представяне на множество входни документи чрез кодиране на взаимодействия между кръстосани проходи. Нашите обширни експерименти показват, че води до значителни подобрения на производителността на два множествено-хопови набора от данни за оценка на качеството: и IIRC. Освен повишаването на производителността е по-интерпретируем, което от своя страна дава отговори, които са по-вярно основани на подкрепящите пасажи и факти в сравнение с базовия модел.', 'nl': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) is een generatief vragenantwoord (QA) model dat gebruik maakt van passage retrieval met een vooraf getrainde transformator en de state of the art op single-hop QA pusht. De complexiteit van multi-hop QA belemmert echter de effectiviteit van de generatieve QA aanpak. In dit werk stellen we een eenvoudige generatieve benadering (PathFid) voor die de taak verder reikt dan alleen het genereren van antwoorden door expliciet het redeneerproces te modelleren om het antwoord op multi-hop vragen op te lossen. Door het hiërarchische redeneringspad van ondersteunende passages, hun sleutelzinnen en tenslotte het feitelijke antwoord te lineariseren, beschouwen we het probleem als een enkele opeenvolgende voorspellingstak. Om complexe redenering met meerdere aanwijzingen te vergemakkelijken, breiden we de uniforme vlakke weergave van meerdere invoerdocumenten verder uit door cross-passage interacties te coderen. Onze uitgebreide experimenten tonen aan dat PathFid leidt tot sterke prestatiewinsten op twee multi-hop QA datasets: HotpotQA en IIRC. Naast de prestatiewinsten is PathFid beter interpreteerbaar, wat op zijn beurt antwoorden oplevert die getrouwer zijn gebaseerd op de ondersteunende passages en feiten in vergelijking met het baseline Fid model.', 'da': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) er en generativ spørgsmål besvarelse (QA) model, der udnytter passage hentning med en prætrænet transformer og skubbede den nyeste teknologi på single-hop QA. Kompleksiteten i multi-hop QA hindrer imidlertid effektiviteten af den generative QA-tilgang. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en enkel generativ tilgang (PathFid), der udvider opgaven ud over blot svargenerering ved eksplicit at modellere ræsonnementsprocessen for at løse svaret på multi-hop spørgsmål. Ved at linearisere den hierarkiske ræsonneringsvej for understøttende passager, deres nøglesætninger og endelig det faktiske svar, kaster vi problemet som en enkelt sekvensforudsigelsesopgave. For at lette kompleks ræsonnement med flere spor, udvider vi yderligere den samlede flade repræsentation af flere input dokumenter ved at kode tværs-passage interaktioner. Vores omfattende eksperimenter viser, at PathFid fører til stærke performance gevinster på to multi-hop QA datasæt: HotpotQA og IIRC. Ud over de ydeevne gevinster, PathFid er mere fortolkelig, hvilket igen giver svar, der er mere trofast baseret på de understøttende passager og fakta sammenlignet med baseline Fid modellen.', 'hr': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard i Grave, 2020) je generični model odgovora na pitanje (QA) koji utiče na povratak prolaza sa predobučenim transformatorom i gura stanje umjetnosti na jednohopnu QA. Međutim, kompleksnost multihopskog QA sprječava učinkovitost generativnog QA pristupa. U ovom poslu predlažemo jednostavan generativni pristup (PathFid), koji proširi zadatak izvan generacije odgovora, jasno modelirajući razumni proces kako bi riješili odgovor na multihopske pitanja. Linerizirajući hijerarhički razumni put podrške prolaza, njihove ključne rečenice i konačno faktoidni odgovor, bacili smo problem kao jedini zadatak predviđanja sekvence. Da bismo olakšali kompleksno razmišljanje s višestrukim tragovima, dalje ćemo proširiti ujedinjenu ravnu predstavu višestrukih ulaznih dokumenta kodiranjem interakcija preko prolaza. Naši široki eksperimenti pokazuju da PathFid vodi do jakih dobitnih učinka na dvije multihopske QA podatke: HotpotQA i IIRC. Osim dobitka učinkovitosti, PathFid je interpretabilniji, što, u turn, daje odgovore koje su vjernije temeljnije na podršku prolaza i činjenice u usporedbi s početnim modelom Fid.', 'de': 'Fusion-in-Decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) ist ein generatives Question Responsing (QA)-Modell, das die Passage Retrieval mit einem vortrainierten Transformator nutzt und den Stand der Technik bei Single-Hop-QA vorantreibt. Die Komplexität der Multi-Hop QA erschwert jedoch die Effektivität des generativen QA Ansatzes. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen einfachen generativen Ansatz (PathFid) vor, der die Aufgabe über die reine Antwortgenerierung hinaus erweitert, indem der Argumentationsprozess explizit modelliert wird, um die Antwort auf Multi-Hop-Fragen zu lösen. Durch die Linearisierung des hierarchischen Denkpfads der unterstützenden Passagen, ihrer Schlüsselsätze und schließlich der faktischen Antwort betrachten wir das Problem als eine einzelne Sequenzvorhersageaufgabe. Um komplexes Denken mit mehreren Hinweisen zu erleichtern, erweitern wir die einheitliche flache Darstellung mehrerer Eingabedokumente durch Codierung von Cross-Passage-Interaktionen. Unsere umfangreichen Experimente zeigen, dass PathFid bei zwei Multi-Hop-QA-Datensätzen zu starken Leistungssteigerungen führt: HotpotQA und IIRC. Neben den Leistungssteigerungen ist PathFid besser interpretierbar, was wiederum Antworten liefert, die den unterstützenden Passagen und Fakten im Vergleich zum Baseline-Fid-Modell treuer zugrunde liegen.', 'ko': 'Fusion in decoder(Fid)(Izacard and Grave, 2020)는 미리 훈련된 변환기를 활용한 단락 검색을 수행하고 단일 점프 QA의 최신 발전을 추진하는 생성적 질의응답(QA) 모델이다.그러나 다중 품질 보증의 복잡성은 생성성 품질 보증 방법의 유효성을 방해한다.이 작업에서 우리는 간단한 생성 방법(PathFid)을 제시했는데 현식 모델링 추리 과정을 통해 다중 점프 문제의 답을 해석하고 임무를 생성된 답만 제외하고 확장시켰다.단락, 관건적인 문장, 최종 인자 답안을 선형화하는 층별 추리 경로를 통해 우리는 문제를 단일 서열 예측 임무로 전환시킬 것이다.다중 단서의 복잡한 추리를 촉진하기 위해 우리는 코딩을 통해 다중 입력 문서의 통일된 평면 표시를 더욱 확장했다.우리의 대량의 실험에 의하면PathFid는 두 개의 다중 점프 QA 데이터 집합인 HotpotQA와 IIRC에서 강력한 성능 향상을 가져왔다.성능 향상 외에 PathFid는 해석성이 뛰어나고 기준 Fid모델에 비해 PathFid가 반대로 만들어낸 답안은 지원성 단락과 사실에 더욱 충실하다.', 'id': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) adalah sebuah model generatif yang menjawab pertanyaan (QA) yang mengakibatkan penemuan lewat dengan transformer terlatih dan mendorong state of the art pada single-hop QA. Namun, kompleksitas QA multi-hop menghalangi efektivitas pendekatan QA generatif. In this work, we propose a simple generative approach (PathFid) that extends the task beyond just answer generation by explicitly modeling the reasoning process to resolve the answer for multi-hop questions.  By linearizing the hierarchical reasoning path of supporting passages, their key sentences, and finally the factoid answer, we cast the problem as a single sequence prediction task.  Untuk memudahkan pemikiran kompleks dengan banyak petunjuk, kita lebih lanjut memperluas representation rata yang bersatu dari dokumen input berbilang dengan mengkodeksi interaksi salib-laluan. Eksperimen ekstensif kami menunjukkan bahwa PathFid memimpin keuntungan prestasi yang kuat pada dua dataset QA multi-hop: HotpotQA dan IIRC. Selain keuntungan pertunjukan, PathFid lebih dapat diterjemahkan, yang menurut suatu qiraat memberikan jawaban yang lebih setia didasarkan pada bagian dan fakta mendukung dibandingkan dengan model Fid dasar.', 'tr': "Fusion-in-kodeýji Ýöne, köp-hop QA-nyň karmaşıklygynyň döredijili QA ýagdaýynyň etkinleşigini engelleýär. Bu işde, çoklu-Hop soruları çözmek için basit jeneratif bir yaklaşma teklif ediyoruz. Ýerinarşik sebäplerini, a çary sözlerini, we soňunda faktoid jogabyny bir gezek çaklamak üçin meseläni çyzyryp başladyk. Çok ipucu ile karmaşık mantıklamayı kolaylaştırmak için, çoklu girdi belgelerini karmaşık geçiş etkileşimlere göre birleştirip, birbirine koyuyoruz Bizim golaý deneylerimiz PathFid'in iki çoklu-Hop QA veri setlerinde güçlü etkinlik gazanmasına yol gösteriyor. HotpotQA we IIRC. Görniş gazançlygynyň daşynda PathFid has ýagdaýynda aňlap terjime edilebilir. Bu ýöne korunan pasajlaryň we çykyşlaryň baseline Fid modeli bilen görä ynamly bolan jogabalary getirýär.", 'fa': 'فسیون-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) یک مدل جواب سوال ژنراتی (QA) است که با یک تغییردهنده پیش آموزش داده می\u200cشود و وضعیت هنر را به یک هوپ QA فشار می\u200cدهد. با این حال، پیچیدگی چندین هوپ QA از فعالیت دستور QA ژنترافی جلوگیری می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم یک روش نسل ساده (PathFid) که کار را بیشتر از نسل جواب داده می\u200cشود با توجه به صورت مشخصا مدل\u200cسازی فرایند منطقی برای حل جواب سوالات چند هپ است. با خطوط کردن مسیر منطقی از پشتیبانی از گذشته ها، جمله\u200cهای کلید آنها، و بالاخره جواب فکتوئید، مشکل را به عنوان یک کار پیش\u200cبینی یک دسته انداختیم. برای آسان کردن دلیل پیچیده با تعدادی از نقطه\u200cهای متعدد، بیشتر نمایش ساده\u200cای از مدارک\u200cهای ورودی\u200cهای متعدد را با تفاوت\u200cهای متعدد عبور می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش های گسترده ما نشان می دهند که PathFid به کمک عملکرد قوی در دو مجموعه داده های چند هوپ QA: HotpotQA و IIRC رهبری می کند. غیر از پیروزی عملکرد، PathFid قابل تعبیر بیشتری است، که در عوض جواب\u200cهایی که به طور اعتقادی بر پایه\u200cهای پشتیبانی و حقیقت\u200cهایی در مقایسه با مدل پایین\u200cخط Fid بسیار باور دارند.', 'sw': 'Mfuko-in-decodi (Fid) (Izacard na Grave, 2020) ni swali la jeni linalojibu (QA) modeli inayotumia upatikanaji wa kurejea upatikanaji kwa mabadiliko ya kabla ya mafunzo na kuishinikiza hali ya sanaa katika kipindi cha pekee cha QA. Hata hivyo, utata wa QA wa watu wengi unazuia ufanisi wa mbinu za Umoja wa QA. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza njia rahisi ya kizalendo (PathFid) ambayo inaongezea kazi zaidi ya kizazi chake kwa kuonyesha wazi mchakato wa maana ili kutatua jibu kwa maswali mengi ya watu wengi. Kwa kuunganisha njia ya msingi ya kusaidia passport, sentensi zao muhimu, na hatimaye jibu la ukweli, tunaleta tatizo kama jukumu la kutabiri moja. Ili kusaidia mahojiano magumu na misingi mbalimbali, tunaongeza uwakilishaji wa bango la pamoja wa nyaraka kadhaa za input by encoding interaction cross-passage. Majaribio yetu makubwa yanaonyesha kuwa PathFid inapelekea mafanikio makubwa ya utendaji katika seti mbili za takwimu za QA: HotpotQA na IIRC. Zaidi ya mafanikio ya utendaji, PathFid inaelezea zaidi, ambapo kwa mwingine hutoa majibu ambayo yanatumiwa kwa imani zaidi na kusaidia misaada na ukweli ukilinganishwa na modeli ya msingi ya Fid.', 'sq': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) is a generative question answering (QA) model that leverages passage retrieval with a pre-trained transformer and pushed the state of the art on single-hop QA.  Megjithatë, kompleksiteti i QA shumëhop ësh pengon efektshmërinë e qasjes gjenerative QA. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një qasje të thjeshtë gjenerative (PathFid) që zgjeron detyrën përtej gjeneratës së përgjigjeve duke modeluar eksplicitalisht procesin e arsyetimit për të zgjidhur përgjigjen për pyetje shumë-hop. Duke linearizuar rrugën hierarkike të arsyetimit të pasazheve mbështetëse, frazat kryesore të tyre, dhe më në fund përgjigjen faktoide, ne e hedhim problemin si një detyrë të vetme parashikimi të sekuencës. Për të lehtësuar arsyetimin kompleks me udhëzime të shumta, ne zgjerojmë më tej përfaqësimin e njëjtë të shenjtë të dokumenteve të shumta të hyrjes duke koduar ndërveprimet ndërkalimtare. Eksperimentet tona të zgjeruara demonstrojnë se PathFid shpie në fitime të forta performancë në dy grupe të dhënash QA me shumë hopa: HotpotQA dhe IIRC. Përveç fitimeve të performancës, PathFid është më i interpretueshëm, e cila nga ana tjetër jep përgjigje që janë më besnikërisht bazuar në pasazhet dhe faktet mbështetëse krahasuar me model in bazë Fid.', 'af': "Fusion-in-dekoder (Fid) (Izacard en Grave, 2020) is 'n genereerbare vraag antwoord (QA) model wat 'n voorafgevorderde transformeerder verkry en die staat van die kuns op enkel-hop QA gedruk het. Maar die kompleksiteit van multi hop QA hinders die effektiviteit van die genereerbare QA toegang. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige genereerbare toegang (PathFid) wat die taak buite regte antwoord generasie uitbrei deur uitduidelik modelleer van die redekende proses om die antwoord vir multihopvrae te oplos. Deur die hierarkiese redekening pad van ondersteun wagte, hul sleutel setnings en eindelik die faktoide antwoord, gooi ons die probleem as 'n enkele volgorde voorskou taak. Om kompleks redering met veelvuldige kloue te eenvoudig, verder uitbrei ons die eenvoudige plat voorstelling van veelvuldige invoer dokumente deur enkodering van kruis-pasgeinteraksies. Ons uitbreidige eksperimente vertoon dat PathFid lei na sterk prestasie oorwinning op twee multi hop QA datastelle: HotpotQA en IIRC. Buiten die prestasie verkry, is PathFid meer uittelbare, wat in turn gee antwoordes wat meer getroulik gegrond is op die ondersteunde wagte en fakte vergelyk met die basisline Fid model.", 'am': 'ፎፎን-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard እና Grave, 2020) አዲስ ጥያቄ መልስ (QA) ሞዴል ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን በብዙ አካባቢ የQA አካባቢነት የጠቅላላ የQA ሥርዓት ጥያቄን ይከለክላል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ለብዙ-ጃፍ ጥያቄዎችን ለመፍትወት መልስ ለመግለጥ የሚችል ቀላል አዋጅ ልማድ (PathFid) ስራውን ከትውልድ ትውልድ በቀር የሚዘረጋ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ መግቢያውን ለመደጋገም እና የክፍለቲው መልስ እና መከራውን በአንድ ሁኔታ ለመፍጠር ስራ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በብዛት ልዩ ልዩ ጉዳዮች ጋር አካሄዱን ለማግናኘት፣ የመስኮት ግንኙነት ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል በተለየ የበለጠ የጥያቄ ሰነዱን አካባቢ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ጥልቅ ፈተናዎች፣ PathFid በሁለት ብልጃፎች የQA ዳታተሮች ላይ ኃይለኛ የድምፅ ውጤት እንዲመራ ያሳያል፡፡ HotpotQA እና IIRC፡፡ ከሥርዓት ግንኙነት በቀር PathFid የሚተረጉም ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Ֆիզիոն-դեկոդերը (Ֆիդը) (Իզաքարդը և Գրավը, 2020 թվականը) սերունդային հարցերին պատասխանող մոդել է, որը օգնում է վերադարձնել անցումը նախապատրաստված վերափոխողի միջոցով և շարժում է տեխնոլոգիաները միանգամից մեկ հուսանքի կենտրոնում: Այնուամենայնիվ, բազմահուսային QA-ի բարդությունը խոչընդոտում է QA-ի սերունդների արդյունավետությունը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք մի պարզ սերունդային մոտեցում (path-FID), որը ընդլայնում է աշխատանքը միայն պատասխանների սերունդից դուրս, առանձնահատկապես մոդելավորելով մտածողական գործընթացը բազմաթիվ հարցերի պատասխանի լուծման համար: Տեղադրելով ուղիներ աջակցելու հիերարխիկ մտածողական ուղին, նրանց հիմնական նախադասությունները և վերջապես փակտոիդ պատասխանը, մենք խնդիրը գցեցինք որպես մեկ հաջորդականության կանխատեսման խնդիր: Բազմաթիվ հնարավորություններով բարդ մտածելակերպման համար մենք ավելի լայնացնում ենք բազմաթիվ ներմուծված փաստաթղթերի միավորված հարթ ներկայացումը՝ կոդավորելով միջանց փոխազդեցությունները: Մեր էքսպենսիվ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ path-ֆիդը հանգեցնում է ուժեղ արդյունավետության բարձրացումներին երկու բազմահոսական QA տվյալների համակարգերի վրա' Հոթպոտ-QA և IINC: Բացի արտադրողականության բարձրացումներից, path-ֆիդը ավելի թարգմանելի է, ինչը իր հերթին պատասխաններ է տալիս, որոնք ավելի հավատարիմ հիմնված են ֆիդը հիմնական մոդելի հետ համեմատած աջակցող հատվածների և փաստերի վրա:", 'bs': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard i Grave, 2020) je generativni model odgovora na pitanje (QA) koji utiče na povratak prolaza sa predobučenim transformatorom i gura stanje umjetnosti na jednohopski QA. Međutim, kompleksnost multihopskog QA sprječava učinkovitost generativnog QA pristupa. U ovom poslu predlažemo jednostavan generativni pristup (PathFid), koji proširi zadatak izvan generacije odgovora, pojasno modelirajući proces razuma kako bi riješili odgovor na multihopske pitanja. Linerizirajući hijerarhički razumni put podrške prolaza, njihove ključne rečenice, i konačno faktoidni odgovor, bacili smo problem kao jedini zadatak predviđanja sekvence. Da bismo olakšali kompleksno razmišljanje s višestrukim tragovima, dalje ćemo proširiti ujedinjenu ravnu predstavu višestrukih ulaznih dokumenta kodiranjem interakcija preko prolaza. Naši široki eksperimenti pokazuju da PathFid vodi do jake dobitke učinkovitosti na dvije multihopske QA podatke: HotpotQA i IIRC. Osim dobitka izvedbe, PathFid je interpretabilniji, što, u turn, daje odgovore koje su vjernije temeljnije na podrške prolaza i činjenice u usporedbi s početnim modelom Fid.', 'az': "Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) bir sual cavab verən (QA) modelidir ki, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş bir transformer ilə keçirməsini tələb edir və sanatın durumunu tək-hop QA üzerində sürükləyir. Ancaq çoxlu-Hop QA'nin kompleksitəsi genetik QA yaxınlığının etkinliğinə mane edir. Bu işdə, çoxlu-Hop sorularının cavabını çəkmək üçün çoxlu dəyişiklik prosesini a çıq-aydın modelləşdirmək üçün asanlıq tədbir tərzini təklif edirik. Səfərləri, anahtar sözləri və sonunda faktoid cavabını linearşik dəyişdirmək yolunu tək seçmək üçün çəkdik. Bircə nöqtələrlə kompleks dəyişiklik olaraq çoxlu dəyişiklikləri asanlaşdırmaq üçün, çoxlu girdi dəyişikliklərinin birləşdirilməsini çoxlu dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərinin kodlaması ilə uzatırıq. Bizim genişliyimiz təcrübələrimiz PathFid'in iki çox-hop QA verilən qurbanları: HotpotQA və IIRC'nin güclü performans qazandığını göstərir. PathFid istifadə etmək üçün daha çox təfsil edilebilir. Bu is ə əsasli Fid modeli ilə qarşılaşdığı dəstəkləyici keçmişlərə və həqiqətlərə daha çox inanılmaz cevaplar verir.", 'bn': 'ফিশন-ইন-ডেকোডার (ফিড) (আইজাকার্ড এবং গ্রেভ, ২০২০) একটি জেনারেটিভ প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউ এ) মডেল যা প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষণিত পরিবর্তনের সাথে প্রতিষ্ঠান প্রদান করে  তবে মাল্টিহোপ কিউএ-এর জটিলতা জেনারেটিভ কিউ এ-এর কার্যক্রমের প্রভাব বাধা দেয়। এই কাজে আমরা একটি সাধারণ জেনারেটিভ উপায় (প্যাথফিড) প্রস্তাব করি যা কেবল উত্তর প্রজন্মের বাইরে কাজ বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে সুস্পষ্ট প্রক্রিয়ার মোডেল করে  পাসগুলোকে সমর্থন করার, তাদের চাবিকার বাক্য এবং অবশেষে ফ্যাক্টোয়িড উত্তরের মাধ্যমে আমরা সমস্যাকে একটি সেকেন্ড ভবিষ্যৎবাণী কাজ হিসেবে র ক্রাস-পাসেজ ইন্টারজেক্টেশনের মাধ্যমে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি ইনপুট নথির প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রসারিত করে বিভিন্ন ফ্ল্যাট প্রতিনিধিত্ আমাদের বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে যে পাথফিড দুই মাল্টিহোপ কিউএ ডাটাসেটে শক্তিশালী প্রদর্শনের ফলাফলের দিকে যাচ্ছে: হোটপট প্রতিযোগিতার অর্জন ছাড়া প্যাথফিড আরো ব্যাখ্যাত, যার ফলে তার উত্তর দেয় যা বেসেলাইন ফিড মডেলের তুলনায় সমর্থন করা পাসগুলোর প্রতি আরো বেশি বিশ্বা', 'ca': "El decodificador de fusió (Fid) (Izacard i Grave, 2020) és un model generador de resposta a preguntes (QA) que aprofita la recuperació de passatges amb un transformador pré-entrenat i empeny l'última tecnologia en QA d'un únic salt. Tot i així, la complexitat de la QA multi hop dificulta l'eficacia de l'enfocament generador de QA. En aquesta feina, proposem un enfocament senzill de generació (PathFid) que estendra la tasca més enllà de només generació de respostes modelant explícitament el procés de raonament per resoldre la resposta a preguntes multihops. Llinearitzant el camí de raonament jeràrquic de recolzament de passatges, les seves frases clau i finalment la resposta factoide, vam posar el problem a com una única tasca de predicció de seqüències. Per facilitar el raonament complexe amb múltiples indicis, estendem més la representació plana unificada de múltiples documents d'entrada codificant interaccions transversals. Els nostres extensos experiments demostren que PathFid porta a forts guanys de rendiment en dos conjunts de dades QA multi hop: HotpotQA i IIRC. A més dels guanys de rendiment, PathFid és més interpretable, que, a su volta, dona respostes que estan més fidelment basades en els passatges i fets de suport comparats amb el model de base Fid.", 'cs': 'Fusion-in-decodér (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) je model generativního zodpovězení otázek (QA), který využívá vyhledávání pasáží s předem vytrénovaným transformátorem a posunul nejmodernější techniku v jednoho hopu QA. Složitost multi-hop QA však brání efektivitě generativního QA přístupu. V této práci navrhujeme jednoduchý generativní přístup (PathFid), který rozšiřuje úlohu mimo pouhé generování odpovědí explicitním modelováním procesu uvažování k řešení odpovědi na multi-hop otázky. Linearizací hierarchického uvažování podpůrných pasáží, jejich klíčových vět a konečně faktické odpovědi jsme tento problém uváděli jako jediný úkol predikce sekvence. Abychom usnadnili komplexní uvažování s několika stopami, dále rozšiřujeme jednotnou plochou reprezentaci více vstupních dokumentů kódováním interakcí mezi průchody. Naše rozsáhlé experimenty ukazují, že PathFid vede k silnému zvýšení výkonu na dvou multi-hop QA datových sadách: HotpotQA a IIRC. Kromě zvýšení výkonu je PathFid interpretovatelnější, což zase poskytuje odpovědi, které jsou věrněji zakotveny podpůrným pasážím a faktům ve srovnání se základním Fid modelem.', 'et': 'Fusion-in-dekooder (Fid) (Izacard ja Grave, 2020) on generatiivne küsimustele vastamise mudel, mis võimendab läbipääsu taastamist eelnevalt koolitatud trafoga ja surub kaasaegset tehnikat ühe hüppe kvaliteedi tagamisel. Mitme hüppega kvaliteedi tagamise keerukus takistab aga generatiivse kvaliteedi tagamise lähenemisviisi tõhusust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja lihtsa generatiivse lähenemisviisi (PathFid), mis laiendab ülesannet kaugemale vaid vastuste genereerimisest, modelleerides selgesõnaliselt põhjendusprotsessi, et lahendada vastus multi-hop küsimustele. Lineariseerides hierarhilist mõtlemist toetavate lõikude, nende võtmelausete ja lõpuks faktilise vastuse, loome probleemi ühe jada ennustamise ülesandeks. Et hõlbustada keerulist arutlemist mitme vihje abil, laiendame veelgi mitme sisenddokumendi ühtset lamedat esitust, kodeerides ristkäigu interaktsioone. Meie ulatuslikud eksperimendid näitavad, et PathFid toob kaasa märkimisväärse jõudluse suurenemise kahes multihüppelises kvaliteedikontrolli andmekogumis: HotpotQA ja IIRC. Peale tulemuslikkuse suurenemise on PathFid tõlgendatavam, mis omakorda annab vastuseid, mis põhinevad ustavamalt toetavatel lõikudel ja faktidel võrreldes baasmudeliga Fid.', 'fi': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard ja Grave, 2020) on generatiivinen kysymys vastausmalli (QA), joka hyödyntää läpikulun noutoa esikoulutetulla muuntajalla ja työnsi huipputekniikkaa yhden hypyn laadunvarmistuksessa. Monisäisen laadunvarmistuksen monimutkaisuus kuitenkin vaikeuttaa generatiivisen laadunvarmistusmenetelmän tehokkuutta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme yksinkertaista generatiivista lähestymistapaa (PathFid), joka laajentaa tehtävän pelkkää vastausta pidemmälle mallintamalla nimenomaisesti päättelyprosessin ratkaisun multi-hop kysymyksiin. Linearisoimalla tukikohtien hierarkkista päättelypolkua, niiden avainlauseita ja lopulta faktoista vastausta, asetamme ongelman yhdeksi sekvenssin ennustamistehtäväksi. Helpottaaksemme monimutkaista päättelyä useilla vihjeillä, laajennamme edelleen useiden syöttöasiakirjojen yhtenäistä litteää esitystä koodaamalla poikkikulkuvaikutuksia. Laajat kokeemme osoittavat, että PathFid johtaa vahvaan suorituskykyyn kahdessa monihypyn laadunvarmistustiedossa: HotpotQA ja IIRC. Suorituskyvyn paranemisen lisäksi PathFid on helpompi tulkita, mikä puolestaan tuottaa vastauksia, jotka perustuvat uskollisemmin tukikohtiin ja faktoihin verrattuna perusmalliin Fid.', 'jv': 'Fsiyon-in-decoder (fixed)(Isacaard and Grave, 2020) iku model sing dadi pangutan nganggo perusahaan seneng pasar dumateng podho ahek nggawe mulasar kelas sistem sing gawe nguasar terus-terus lanjut sampeyan karo perusahaan seneng sampeyan mruput. Nanging, sampeyan karo akeh-pilihan Njupuk sing paling nggawe gerakan ngono nggawe barang kelas Njupuk. Nang iné, kéné gunakake sistem sing nyimpen kelangan panganan lahir (pathfi)sing paling nggawe barang pengguna dianggawe barang kelangan winih dhéwé ngesalakno perusahaan sampek iso nggawe barang langgar sampek yang geranggawe geranggap bantuan suarané. Rayong politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing bisalahan nyenengaké Path Fd lakurip nggawe barang nggawe barang iki multi-top Mbak yo mbok saiki perusahaan, Path fi dadi luwih akeh perusahaan, sing ngomong nik awak dhéwé manut sing luwih apik dhéwé nggawe pasangan ngono perusahaan karo perusahaan karo model sing bakal terus nyimpen', 'ha': "Fusion-in-Decoder (Fid) (IzaCard and Grave, 2020) is a matsayin mai tambaya mai kyau (QA) mai amfani da motsi wanda ke samar da samura da mai amfani da sabo-retriecewa da aka haramta shi a gabã ɗaya na goge the state of the art on one-jum QA. Kayya, adadin QA na ƙara da amfani da matsayin QA. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wata hanyarwa mai sauƙi (PashFid) wanda ke shimfiɗa aikin baya wa kizata kawai, kafin da za'a bayyana shirin jarrabar masu hankali dõmin ya karɓi jibin masu tambayar multi-jum. Ga ku danna hanya na haƙƙin hierrarci da za'a ƙara taimakon tafarki, musamman maɓallinsu, da kuma ƙarshen jibar da faktoid, za'a jẽfa muammãni kamar aikin bayani na guda. To, don ka sauƙaƙara wa masu husũma da shiryarwa masu yawa, za mu ƙara wa mai haɗa shirin flat mai nuna wa takardar inputi masu yawa da kodi-interaction. Kayan jarrabai masu shimfiɗaɗãwa sun nuna at PashFid yana ƙara mafaniki mai ƙarfi a kan danne biyu masu yawa-jumbo QA: HotPotsQA da IIRC. Baicin rabon aikin bayani, PashFid yana da mafi fassarawa, wanda yana iya motsa masu gaskiyar da gaskiyar a sami da misalin Fid na Baselin.", 'sk': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard in Grave, 2020) je generativni model odgovarjanja na vprašanja (QA), ki izkorišča pridobivanje prehoda z vnaprej usposobljenim transformatorjem in potisne najsodobnejšo tehnologijo pri enoskopskem QA. Vendar pa kompleksnost zagotavljanja kakovosti z več postopki ovira učinkovitost generativnega pristopa zagotavljanja kakovosti. V tem delu predlagamo preprost generativni pristop (PathFid), ki razširi nalogo preko zgolj generiranja odgovorov z izrecnim modeliranjem procesa razmišljanja za reševanje odgovorov na multi-hop vprašanja. Z linearizacijo hierarhičnega razmišljanja podpornih odlomkov, njihovih ključnih stavkov in končno dejanskega odgovora smo problem oblikovali kot enotno nalogo napovedovanja zaporedja. Da bi olajšali kompleksno razmišljanje z več namigi, nadalje razširimo enotno plosko predstavitev več vhodnih dokumentov s kodiranjem prehodnih interakcij. Naši obsežni eksperimenti kažejo, da PathFid vodi do močnega povečanja učinkovitosti dveh naborov podatkov o kakovosti z več koraki: HotpotQA in IIRC. Poleg povečanja uspešnosti je PathFid bolj razložljiv, kar pa prinaša odgovore, ki so bolj zvesto utemeljeni na podporne odlomke in dejstva v primerjavi z osnovnim Fid modelom.', 'he': 'פיד (באנגלית: Fusion-in-decoder, Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) הוא מודל דולרי שעובר על שאלות דולריות (QA) שממשיך להשיג מעבר עם מעבר מאומן מראש עם זאת, המורכבות של QA Multi-Hop מכניסה את היעילות של גישת QA הדורתית. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים גישה דורית פשוטה (PathFid) שמארכה את המשימה מעבר לדור רק תשובה על ידי דוגמנית באופן ברור את תהליך ההיגיון לפתור את התשובה לשאלות multi-hop. על ידי לינריזציה של מסלול ההיגיון היררכי של תמיכה במעברים, המשפטים המפתחים שלהם, ולבסוף התשובה הפקטואידית, אנחנו משליכים את הבעיה כמשימה צפוי רצף אחד. כדי להקל בהיגיון מורכב עם רמזים רבים, אנו ממשיכים להאריך את מייצג השטוח המאוחד של מסמכי הכניסה רבים על ידי קידום אינטראקציות דרך מעבר. הניסויים המרחבים שלנו מראים שPathFid מוביל לזכויות ביצועים חזקות בשני קבוצות מידע QA multi-hop: HotpotQA ו IIRC. חוץ מהזכויות ביצועים, PathFid הוא יותר ניתן לפרש, מה שבturn נותן תשובות שמבוססות באופן נאמן יותר למעברים ותועדויות המתמיכות בהשוואה למודל Fid בסיסי.', 'bo': 'Fusion-in-decoder (Fid) (Izacard and Grave, 2020) is a generative question answer (QA) model that leverages the passage retrieval with a pre-trained transformer and pushes the art of the state on single-hop QA. ཡིན་ནའང་། སྣ་མང་གསོག་སྡོད་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་གྲུབ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In this work, we propose a simple generative approach (PathFid) that extends the task beyond just answer generation by explicitly modeling the reasoning process to solve the answer for multi-hop questions. དེ་ནི་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོའི་གཙོ་ཆོག་ཚིག་དང་། To facilitate complex reasoning with multiple clues, we further extend the unified flat representation of multiple input documents by encoding cross-passage interactions. Our extensive experiments demonstrate that PathFid leads to strong performance gains on two multi-hop QA datasets: HotpotQA and IIRC. PathFid ཡིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་མེད་པར། ཡིན་ཡང་ཨང་ཚིག་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་མང་ཙམ་རྟོགས་ཐུབ།'}
{'en': 'Identifying Moments of Change from Longitudinal User Text', 'ar': 'تعلم التمثيل الدلالي المنفصل عن النقل عبر اللغات بدون طلقة في فهم القراءة الآلي متعدد اللغات', 'pt': 'Aprendendo representações semânticas desembaraçadas para transferência interlinguística zero-shot na compreensão de leitura de máquina multilíngue', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de representaciones semánticas desenredadas para la transferencia interlingüística de tiro cero en la comprensión de lectura automática multilingüe', 'fr': 'Apprentissage de représentations sémantiques démêlées pour un transfert multilingue à jet zéro dans la compréhension de lecture automatique multilingue', 'zh': '多语言机器读解中学零次跨语移者解缠语义示', 'ja': '多言語マシン読解理解におけるゼロショットのクロスリンガル転送のための分離されたセマンティック表現の学習', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन में शून्य-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर के लिए अलग-अलग शब्दार्थ अभ्यावेदन सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение разрозненным семантическим представлениям для кросс-лингвальной передачи с нулевым выстрелом в многоязычном машинном чтении', 'ga': 'Léirithe Séimeantacha Dícheangailte a Fhoghlaim d’Aistriú Trastheangach le Nialas Urchar i dTuiscint Léitheoireachta Meaisín Ilteangach', 'hu': 'Tanulás zavaros szemantikus reprezentációk a zéró-lövéses nyelvi transzferhez a többnyelvű gépi olvasási értékben', 'el': 'Μάθηση των διασυνδεδεμένων σημαντικών αναπαραστάσεων για μηδενική-πυροβολιστική διαγώνια-γλωσσική μεταφορά στην πολυγλωσσική κατανόηση ανάγνωσης μηχανών', 'ka': 'სწავლება განსხვავებული Semantic Representations for Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Multilingual Machine Reading Comprehension', 'lt': 'Mokymasis nesusijusiomis Semantinėmis atstovybėmis, skirtomis nuliniam tarpkalbiniam perdavimui daugiakalbėse mašinose skaitant supratimą', 'kk': 'Көптілікті механизм оқу компрессиясындағы Zero-Shot көпшілікті тілікті транспорттау үшін өзгертілген Semantic Representations', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'it': 'Rappresentazioni semantiche disorientate per il trasferimento cross-linguale a scatto zero nella comprensione della lettura automatica multilingue', 'mk': 'Научи растурени семантични претставувања за нула- пукачки крстојазичен трансфер во мнографски компресија за читање машина', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Perwakilan Semantik Disentangled untuk Pemindahan Semang-Semang Sema-Sema Sema-Sema Sema-Tembak Sema-Sema dalam Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin Berbahasa', 'mt': 'Learning Disentangled Semantic Representations for Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Multilingual Machine Reading Comprehension', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний машины унших шаардлагатай салбарын төлөөлөлт сурах', 'no': 'Læring av disntanglerte semantiske representasjonar for null-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer i fleirspråk maskinelesing Comprehension', 'sr': 'Naučenje dezontaliziranih semantičkih predstavljanja za prekršnu prebacivanje nulo-pucnjave u višejezičkoj komprenciji za čitanje mašine', 'pl': 'Uczenie się rozdzielonych reprezentacji semantycznych dla zerowo-strzałowego transferu między językami w wielojęzycznym zrozumieniu czytania maszynowego', 'ro': 'Învățarea reprezentărilor semantice dezîncurcate pentru transferul translingvistic Zero-Shot în înțelegerea citirii mașinilor multilingve', 'sv': 'Lärande Disentangled Semantiska representationer för noll-skott tvärspråklig överföring i flerspråkig maskinläsförståelse', 'si': 'ඉගෙන ගන්න බිස්ටන්ගල් සෙමාන්ටික් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Multilanguage machine Reading Comprebension', 'ur': 'صفر-شٹ کروس-لینگئال ٹرانسفور کے لئے سیکھ رہے ہیں سیمنٹانگلڈ سیمنٹینٹیکس ریڈینگ کمپرینس میں', 'so': 'Waxbarashada cilmiga sinaanta ah ee u bedela iskuul-shoot-Lingual in lagu baro mashiinka luuqadaha badan ee akhriska', 'ta': 'சூரோ- ஷாட்- கிராஸ்- கோட்டு மாற்றுதலுக்கான திருப்பங்களை கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பல மொழி இயந்திரத்தில் படிக்கும் முடிவு', 'vi': 'Học hỏi lại môi trường trung học cho việc truyền nhiễm qua nhiều ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Учене на дисциплинирани семантични представяния за нулев изстрел в междуезиков трансфер в многоезичното машинно четене', 'nl': 'Het leren van verstrikte semantische representaties voor Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in meertalig machineleesbegrip', 'da': 'Læring Disentangled Semantiske repræsentationer til Zero-Shot tværsproglig overførsel i flersproget maskinlæsning forståelse', 'hr': 'Naučenje dezontaliziranih semantičkih predstavljanja za prekršnu prebacivanje nulo-pucnjave u višejezičkoj komprenciji čitanja strojeva', 'de': 'Learning Disangled Semantic Representations for Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Multilingual Machine Reading Comprehension', 'id': 'Mempelajari Perwakilan Semantik Disentangled untuk Transfer Linguan Sementar Zero-Shot dalam Kompresi Pembacaan Mesin Berbahasa', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای سیمنتیک بیماری برای تغییرات زبان\u200cهای مختلف صفر در تغییر خواندن ماشین\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cها', 'ko': '다언어 기계 읽기 이해 중 0차 크로스 언어 이동의 비교착 의미 표징 학습', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Representation of Semantic Disabled for Transfer of Cross-Lingua-Zero-Shot in Mashine ya lugha nyingi Reading Composition', 'tr': 'Disentangled Semantic Representations for Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Multilingual Machine Reading Comprehension', 'af': 'Leer ondersteunde semantiese voorstellings vir Zero-Shot Kruis-Linguaal Oordrag in Multilingual Masjien Lees Komplerensie', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfaqësimeve Semantike të Zhgënjyer për Transferimin e Zero-Shot Kryqëgjuhësor në Kompresionin e Leximit të Makinës Shumë-gjuhësore', 'am': 'የመስመር ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Սովորել բազլեզու մեքենայի ընթերցման ընկալում զրո-կրակի խաչլեզվի փոխանցման բազլեզու սեմատիկ ներկայացումներ', 'bn': 'মাল্টিভুয়াল মেশিনে জিরো-শোট-লিঙ্গুয়াল ট্রান্সফারের জন্য বিভ্রান্ত সেমান্টিক প্রতিনিধি শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'az': 'Sıfır-Shot Çift-Lingual Transferi üçün Səfərlənmiş Semantik İşyaları Öyrənmək', 'bs': 'Naučenje dezontaliziranih semantičnih predstavljanja za prekršnu prebacivanje nulo-pucnjave u višejezičkoj komprenciji čitanja mašine', 'ca': 'Aprendre representacions Semàtiques Disentangled per Transfer Trans-Lingual Zero-Shot en Comprehension Multilingual Machine Reading', 'cs': 'Učení rozdělených sémantických reprezentací pro nulový crosslinguální přenos v rozumění vícejazyčného strojového čtení', 'et': 'Õppimine eraldatud semantilised esindused Zero-Shot keeleülese ülekande jaoks mitmekeelses masinlugemises', 'fi': 'Oppiminen hajautetut semanttiset esitykset Zero-Shot-kieliseen siirtoon monikielisessä konelukutaidossa', 'jv': 'Learning Disantagled semanti representations for nulo-shot krus-Lingul transfer in Multilanguage Device Reading Compréncion', 'sk': 'Učenje razvezanih semantičnih predstavitev za ničelni medjezikovni prenos v večjezičnem razumevanju strojnega branja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ללמוד מייצגים סמנטיים מבולבלים עבור העברת שולית ללא יריות בהבנה של קריאת מכונות רבות שפות', 'bo': 'Learning Disentangled Semantic Representations for Zero-Shot Cross-Lingual Transfer in Multilingual Machine Reading Comprehension'}
{'en': 'Identifying changes in individuals behaviour and mood as observed via content shared on online platforms is increasingly gaining importance Most research to date on this topic focuses on either a identifying individuals at risk or with a certain mental health condition given a batch of posts or b providing equivalent labels at the post level A disadvantage of such work is the lack of a strong temporal component and the inability to make longitudinal assessments following an individual’s trajectory and allowing timely interventions Here we define a new task that of identifying moments of change in individuals on the basis of their shared content online The changes we consider are sudden shifts in mood switches or gradual mood progression escalations We have created detailed guidelines for capturing moments of change and a corpus of manually annotated user timelines 18.7 K posts We have developed a variety of baseline models drawing inspiration from related tasks and show that the best performance is obtained through context aware sequential modelling We also introduce new metrics for capturing rare events in temporal windows', 'ar': 'النماذج متعددة اللغات المدربة مسبقًا قادرة على نقل المعرفة بدون طلقة من اللغات الغنية بالموارد إلى اللغات منخفضة الموارد في فهم قراءة الآلة (MRC). ومع ذلك ، فإن التناقضات اللغوية المتأصلة في اللغات المختلفة يمكن أن تجعل فترات الإجابة التي تم توقعها بنقل اللقطة الصفرية تنتهك القيود النحوية للغة الهدف. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا جديدًا متعدد اللغات لـ MRC مزودًا بنموذج سيامي لفك التشابك الدلالي (S2DM) لفصل الدلالات عن بناء الجملة في التمثيلات التي تعلمتها النماذج متعددة اللغات المدربة مسبقًا. لنقل المعرفة الدلالية فقط بشكل صريح إلى اللغة الهدف ، نقترح مجموعتين من الخسائر المصممة خصيصًا للتشفير الدلالي والنحوي وفك التشابك. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات MRC متعددة اللغات (على سبيل المثال ، XQuAD و MLQA و TyDi QA) فعالية نهجنا المقترح على النماذج القائمة على mBERT و XLM-100.', 'es': 'Los modelos multilingües preentrenados son capaces de transferir el conocimiento de forma inmediata de lenguajes de recursos ricos a idiomas de bajos recursos en la comprensión de lectura automática (MRC). Sin embargo, las discrepancias lingüísticas inherentes en diferentes idiomas podrían hacer que los intervalos de respuesta pronosticados por la transferencia cero violen las restricciones sintácticas del idioma de destino. En este artículo, proponemos un novedoso marco MRC multilingüe equipado con un Modelo de Desenredo Semántico Siamés (S2DM) para disociar la semántica de la sintaxis en representaciones aprendidas por modelos multilingües preentrenados. Para transferir explícitamente solo el conocimiento semántico al idioma de destino, proponemos dos grupos de pérdidas adaptados para la codificación semántica y sintáctica y el desenredado. Los resultados experimentales en tres conjuntos de datos MRC multilingües (es decir, XQuad, MLQA y TyDi QA) demuestran la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto sobre los modelos basados en mBert y XLM-100.', 'pt': 'Modelos pré-treinados multilíngues são capazes de transferir conhecimento de recursos ricos para idiomas com poucos recursos em compreensão de leitura de máquina (MRC). No entanto, discrepâncias linguísticas inerentes em diferentes idiomas podem fazer com que os intervalos de resposta previstos pela transferência zero-shot violem as restrições sintáticas do idioma de destino. Neste artigo, propomos um novo framework MRC multilíngue equipado com um Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) para desassociar a semântica da sintaxe em representações aprendidas por modelos multilíngues pré-treinados. Para transferir explicitamente apenas o conhecimento semântico para a língua-alvo, propomos dois grupos de perdas sob medida para codificação e desembaraçamento semântico e sintático. Resultados experimentais em três conjuntos de dados MRC multilíngues (ou seja, XQuAD, MLQA e TyDi QA) demonstram a eficácia de nossa abordagem proposta sobre modelos baseados em mBERT e XLM-100.', 'fr': "Les modèles pré-entraînés multilingues sont capables de transférer des connaissances de langues riches vers des langues à faibles ressources en compréhension de lecture automatique (MRC). Toutefois, des divergences linguistiques inhérentes aux différentes langues peuvent faire en sorte que les plages de réponses prédites par le transfert zero-shot violent les contraintes syntaxiques de la langue cible. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau cadre MRC multilingue équipé d'un modèle sémantique de désentanglement siamois (S2DM) pour dissocier la sémantique de la syntaxe dans les représentations apprises par des modèles pré-entraînés multilingues. Pour transférer explicitement uniquement les connaissances sémantiques vers la langue cible, nous proposons deux groupes de pertes adaptés au codage et au démêlage sémantique et syntaxique. Les résultats expérimentaux sur trois ensembles de données MRC multilingues (c.-à-d. XQuad, MLQA et TyDi QA) démontrent l'efficacité de notre approche proposée par rapport aux modèles basés sur mBERt et XLM-100.", 'ja': '多言語の事前トレーニング済みモデルは、機械読解（ MRC ）で知識を豊富なリソースの言語から低リソースの言語にゼロショットで転送することができます。しかし、異なる言語における固有の言語的矛盾は、ゼロショット転送によって予測される回答スパンを、対象言語の構文的制約に違反させる可能性がある。この論文では、事前に訓練された多言語モデルによって学習された表現における構文からセマンティクスを切り離すために、Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model （ S 2 DM ）を備えた新規の多言語MRCフレームワークを提案する。セマンティック・ナレッジのみをターゲット言語に明示的に転送するために、セマンティックおよび構文エンコードと解離に合わせた2つの損失グループを提案します。３つの多言語MRCデータセット（すなわち、XQuAD、MLQA、およびTyDi QA ）の実験結果は、mBERTおよびXLM -100に基づくモデルに対する提案されたアプローチの有効性を示している。', 'zh': '多言预练模形机器读解(MRC)中移知从丰资言语零镜头移于低资源语。 然言语固有差别零次传输或失零次传输占跨度违者句法约束。 本文,我们发出一种新型多言语MRC框架,该框架配备了暹罗语义离模(S2DM),以将语义与多言语预练模形学习的语法离。 明地仅移语义于语言,两组针语义句法编码离制之损。 3多言MRC数集(XQuAD、MLQA、TyDi QA)之实验结果表明,优于mBERT、XLM-100之有效性。', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन (एमआरसी) में रिच-रिसोर्स से कम-संसाधन भाषाओं में ज्ञान को शून्य-शॉट ट्रांसफर करने में सक्षम हैं। हालांकि, विभिन्न भाषाओं में अंतर्निहित भाषाई विसंगतियां शून्य-शॉट हस्तांतरण द्वारा भविष्यवाणी की गई उत्तर स्पैन को लक्ष्य भाषा की वाक्यात्मक बाधाओं का उल्लंघन कर सकती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम बहुभाषी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल द्वारा सीखे गए अभ्यावेदन में वाक्यविन्यास से शब्दार्थ को अलग करने के लिए एक सियामी सिमेंटिक डिसेंटेक्स मॉडल (S2DM) से लैस एक उपन्यास बहुभाषी एमआरसी फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। लक्ष्य भाषा में केवल शब्दार्थ ज्ञान को स्पष्ट रूप से स्थानांतरित करने के लिए, हम शब्दार्थ और वाक्यात्मक एन्कोडिंग और विघटन के लिए अनुरूप नुकसान के दो समूहों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। तीन बहुभाषी MRC डेटासेट (यानी, XQuAD, MLQA, और TyDi QA) पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम mBERT और XLM-100 के आधार पर मॉडल पर हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Многоязычные предварительно обученные модели способны передавать знания с нулевого выстрела из языков с богатыми ресурсами в языки с низкими ресурсами в понимании машинного чтения (MRC). Тем не менее, языковые расхождения, присущие различным языкам, могут привести к тому, что диапазон ответов, предсказанный передачей с нулевым выстрелом, будет нарушать синтаксические ограничения целевого языка. В этой статье мы предлагаем новый многоязычный каркас MRC, оснащенный сиамской семантической моделью распутывания (S2DM), чтобы отделить семантику от синтаксиса в представлениях, изучаемых многоязычными предварительно обученными моделями. Для явной передачи в целевой язык только семантических знаний мы предлагаем две группы потерь, адаптированные для семантического и синтаксического кодирования и распутывания. Экспериментальные результаты по трем многоязычным наборам данных MRC (т.е. XQuAD, MLQA и TyDi QA) демонстрируют эффективность предлагаемого нами подхода по сравнению с моделями, основанными на mBERT и XLM-100.', 'ga': 'Tá samhlacha réamhoilte ilteangacha in ann eolas a aistriú ó theangacha saibhre-acmhainne go teangacha íseal-acmhainne i dtuiscint meaisín (MRC). Mar sin féin, d’fhéadfadh neamhréireachtaí dúchasacha teanga i dteangacha éagsúla cur isteach ar réisí freagraí a thuarfadh aistriú náid ar shrianta comhréire na sprioctheanga. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat nua MRC ilteangach atá feistithe le Samhail um Dhícheangal Séimeantach Siamese (S2DM) chun an tséimeantaic a dhícheangal ón gcomhréir in uiríll a foghlaimíodh ó mhúnlaí ilteangacha réamhoilte. Chun eolas séimeantach amháin a aistriú go sainráite go dtí an sprioctheanga, molaimid dhá ghrúpa de chaillteanais atá oiriúnaithe don ionchódú agus don dícheangal shéimeantach agus chomhréire. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thrí thacar sonraí ilteangacha MRC (i.e., XQuAD, MLQA, agus TyDi QA) éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige molta i leith samhlacha atá bunaithe ar mBERT agus XLM-100.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű, előre képzett modellek képesek a gépi olvasási értésben (MRC) szereplő tudást nullára átadni a gazdag erőforrásból az alacsony erőforrásból származó nyelvekre. Azonban a különböző nyelvekben rejlő nyelvi eltérések miatt a nulla lövéses átvitel által előrejelzett választartományok sérthetik a célnyelv szintaktikai korlátait. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új, többnyelvű MRC keretrendszert javasolunk, amely egy sziámi szemantikai diszpergálási modellel (S2DM) felszereltek, hogy elválassza a szemantikát a szintaxistól a többnyelvű előképzett modellek által tanult reprezentációkban. Annak érdekében, hogy kifejezetten csak a szemantikai ismereteket továbbítsuk a célnyelvre, két veszteségcsoportot javasolunk, amelyek szemantikai és szintaktikus kódolásra és szétbontásra szabottak. Három többnyelvű MRC adatkészleten (pl. XQuAD, MLQA és TyDi QA) végzett kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják a javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságát az mBERT és XLM-100 modellekkel szemben.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური წინატრიქტირებული მოდელები შეუძლია ნულ-სტრიქტირებული მეცნიერების გადატვირთვას ბეჭდვი რესურსისგან ცოტაციას ჩატვირთვა მაქსინური წინა მაგრამ, განსხვავებული ენების ინტერესტიკური განსხვავებები შეიძლება გაუპასუხოთ სინტრაქტიკური განსხვავებები, რომლებიც ნულ სტრინქტურის გადაწყვეტილი სინტრაქტიკური განს ამ დომენტში ჩვენ პრომენტის მრავალენგური MRC ფრამეტრი, რომელიც სიამური Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) გამოყენებულია სინტაქსიდან სიმანტიკის გამოყენება მრავალენგური მოდელების გამოყენებაში. მხოლოდ სიმენტიკური ცნობიერების გადატანისთვის, ჩვენ მხოლოდ სემონტიკური კოდენტიკური კოდენტიკური და გადაწყვეტილებისთვის ორი ჯგუფი დასრულებული დასრულება. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები სამი მრავალენგური MRC მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში (მაგალითად XQuAD, MLQA, და Tydi QA) გამოჩვენებს ჩვენი მონაცემების ეფექტიურობა მოდელზე, რომელიც mBERT და XLM-100', 'el': 'Τα πολύγλωσσα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα είναι σε θέση να μεταφέρουν γνώσεις από γλώσσες πλούσιων πόρων σε γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας στην κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης (MRC). Ωστόσο, οι εγγενείς γλωσσικές αποκλίσεις σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες θα μπορούσαν να κάνουν τα διαστήματα απαντήσεων που προβλέπονται από τη μεταφορά μηδενικού πυροβολισμού παραβιάζουν συντακτικούς περιορισμούς της γλώσσας-στόχου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πολύγλωσσο πλαίσιο που είναι εξοπλισμένο με ένα Σιαμικό Σημαντικό Μοντέλο Διασύνδεσης (για να διαχωρίσει τη σημασιολογία από τη σύνταξη σε αναπαραστάσεις που μαθαίνονται από πολύγλωσσα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα. Για να μεταφέρουμε ρητά μόνο σημασιολογική γνώση στη γλώσσα-στόχο, προτείνουμε δύο ομάδες απωλειών προσαρμοσμένες για σημασιολογική και συντακτική κωδικοποίηση και αποσύνδεση. Πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε τρία πολύγλωσσα σύνολα δεδομένων (δηλαδή XQuAD, MLQA και TyDi QA) καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας σε σχέση με μοντέλα βασισμένα σε mBERT και XLM-100.', 'it': "I modelli plurilingui pre-addestrati sono in grado di trasferire conoscenze da linguaggi ricchi di risorse a lingue a basso contenuto di risorse nella comprensione della lettura automatica (MRC). Tuttavia, le discrepanze linguistiche intrinseche in diverse lingue potrebbero far sì che gli intervalli di risposta previsti dal trasferimento zero-shot violassero i vincoli sintattici della lingua di destinazione. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo framework multilingue MRC dotato di un modello siamese di dissociazione semantica dalla sintassi nelle rappresentazioni apprese da modelli multilingui pre-formati. Per trasferire esplicitamente solo la conoscenza semantica alla lingua di destinazione, proponiamo due gruppi di perdite su misura per la codifica semantica e sintattica e il disantanglement. I risultati sperimentali su tre set di dati MRC multilingue (cioè XQuAD, MLQA e TyDi QA) dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto rispetto ai modelli basati su mBERT e XLM-100.", 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілді алдын- ала оқылған үлгілер машина оқу үшін (MRC) баяны ресурстардан төмен ресурстардың тілдеріне мәліметтерді нөл- түрлі аударуға болады. Бірақ басқа тілдер тілдерінде тілдердің тілдерінің қасиеттері нөл- шоу трансфертінің синтактикалық шектерінің жауап беруге болады. Бұл қағазда, біз бірнеше тілді MRC бағдарламасын сиамезалық Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) синтаксисінен бірнеше тілді алдын- ала оқылған үлгілерден үйренген синтаксисінің синтаксисінен семантикалық құрылғыларды бөліктеу үшін ұсындық Біз тек semantic білімдерді мақсатты тіліне ауыстыру үшін, semantic, syntactic encoding және тарату үшін керек екі топ жоғалуды таңдаймыз. Үш көптілік MRC деректер жиынының эксперименталдық нәтижелері (яғни XQuAD, MLQA, және TyDi QA) мBERT және XLM-100 негіздеген моделдерге негізделген тәртіпсіздігіміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Daugiakalbiai iš anksto parengti modeliai gali nuliniu būdu perduoti žinias iš turtingų išteklių į mažai išteklių turinčias kalbas skaitant mašinas (MRC). Tačiau dėl būdingų kalbinių skirtumų skirtingose kalbose atsakymų intervalai, numatyti nulinio nuotraukos perdavimo būdu, gali pažeisti sintaktinius tikslinės kalbos apribojimus. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują daugiakalbį MRC sistemą, kuria įrengtas Siamo Semantinio išsiskyrimo modelis (S2DM), siekiant atskirti semantiką nuo sintaksijos daugiakalbių išankstinio mokymo modelių atstovavimuose. Siekiant aiškiai perduoti tik semantines žinias tikslinei kalbai, siūlome dvi nuostolių grupes, pritaikytas semantinei ir sintaktinei kodavimui ir atskirčiai. Eksperimentiniai trijų daugiakalbių MRC duomenų rinkinių (t. y. XQuAD, MLQA ir TyDi QA) rezultatai rodo mūsų siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą modeliams, pagrįstiems mBERT ir XLM-100.', 'mk': 'Мултијазичните предобучени модели можат да го префрлат знаењето со нула снимка од богатите ресурси на јазиците со ниски ресурси во разбирање на машинското читање (МРЦ). Сепак, интерентните јазички дискрепанции на различни јазици би можеле да го направат промената на одговорот предвидена со трансфер со нула снимка да ги прекрши синтактичките ограничувања на јазикот на целта. Во овој весник, предложуваме нова мултијазична рамка за МРК опремена со сијамски семантичен модел за раздвојување (С2ДМ) за раздвојување на семантиката од синтаксијата во претставувањата научени од мултијазични предобучени модели. За експлицитно да го префрлиме само семантичното знаење на јазикот на целта, предложуваме две групи загуби прилагодени за семантично и синтактичко кодирање и разделување. Експерименталните резултати на трите мултијазични МРЦ податоци (т.е., XQuAD, MLQA и TyDi QA) ја демонстрираат ефикасноста на нашиот предложен пристап во однос на моделите базирани на mBERT и XLM-100.', 'ms': 'Model berlatih-dilatih berbilang bahasa mampu memindahkan pengetahuan 0-shot dari sumber-kaya ke bahasa-sumber-rendah dalam pemahaman pembacaan mesin (MRC). However, inherent linguistic discrepancies in different languages could make answer spans predicted by zero-shot transfer violate syntactic constraints of the target language.  Dalam kertas ini, kami melaporkan rangkaian MRC berbilang bahasa yang baru yang dilengkapi dengan Model Penghapusan Seman Siama (S2DM) untuk menyatukan semantik dari sintaks dalam perwakilan yang belajar oleh model berbilang bahasa yang dilatih. Untuk secara eksplicit hanya memindahkan pengetahuan semantik ke bahasa sasaran, kami cadangkan dua kumpulan kerugian yang disesuaikan untuk pengekodan semantik dan sintaktik dan penyelesaian. Keputusan percubaan pada tiga set data MRC berbilang bahasa (iaitu XQuAD, MLQA, dan TyDi QA) menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan yang kami cadangkan terhadap model berdasarkan mBERT dan XLM-100.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് സമ്പത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വിഭവവിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷകളിലേക്ക് ജ്ഞാനം മാറ്റാ എങ്കിലും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലുള്ള ഭാഷകളിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം പറയാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് പൂജ്യ വെടിവെക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്പേന്\u200dസ്  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മുള്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d പരിശീലന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിയാമിസ് സെമാന്റിക് ഡിസ്നെന്\u200dഗ്ലെന്\u200dഗ്ലേഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d  സെമാന്റിക് അറിവ് മാത്രം ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷയിലേക്ക് മാറ്റാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് കൂട്ടര്\u200d നഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സെമാന്റിക്കും സിനിക്ക മൂന്നു മാള്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d ഭാഷ എംആര്\u200dസി ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэлний өмнө сургалтын загварууд машины унших боломжтой (MRC) хэлээр баян боловсруулагч хэлбэрээс хамгийн бага боловсруулагч мэдлэгийг цогц шилжүүлж чадна. Гэхдээ өөр хэл дээр хэлэлцдэг хэлний ялгаатай байдал нь 0-шүдний шилжүүлэлт нь зорилготой хэлний синтактик хязгаарлалтыг бууруулж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) болон олон хэлний өмнөх сургалтын загвараар сурсан үзүүлэлт дээр синтаксисаас үр дүнг сайжруулахын тулд олон хэлний MRC хэлний фрэйм хангамжийг санал болгож байна. Зөвхөн semantic мэдлэгийг зорилготой хэл руу шилжүүлэхэд бид semantic, syntactic encoding, separation гэх мэт хоёр бүлэг алдагдлыг санал болгож байна. Гурван хэл MRC өгөгдлийн сангуудын туршилтын үр дүнг (яг XQuAD, MLQA, TyDi QA) нь mBERT болон XLM-100 дээр суурилсан моделууд дээр бидний санал өгсөн арга загварын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Fleirspråksprøvde modeller kan forstørra kunnskapen frå rike ressurs til låg ressursspråk i maskinelesingsforstørringar (MRC). I tillegg kan imidlertid innhaldne lingviske forskjeller i ulike språk gjera svarspunkt som foregår av nullstatt overføring, som violerer syntaktiske begrensningar for målspråket. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit romant multilingual MRC-rammeverk med ein Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) for å katasialisere semantikk frå syntaks i representasjonar lært av fleirspråksprøvde modeller. For å flytta berre semantisk kunnskap til målspråket, foreslår vi to grupper tap som er tilpassa for semantisk og syntaktisk koding og forstyring. Eksperimentale resultat på tre fleirspråk MRC-datasett (t.d. XQuAD, MLQA og TyDi QA) viser effektiviteten av vår foreslått tilnærming over modeller basert på mBERT og XLM-100.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli multilingwi mħarrġa minn qabel huma kapaċi jittrasferixxu l-għarfien mingħajr skop ta’ trasferiment minn lingwi b’riżorsi kbar għal lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi fil-komprensjoni tal-qari bil-magni (MRC). Madankollu, id-diskrepanzi lingwistiċi inerenti f’lingwi differenti jistgħu jagħmlu l-firxa ta’ risposti mbassra minn trasferiment b’żero-shot jiksru r-restrizzjonijiet sintetiċi tal-lingwa fil-mira. In this paper, we propose a novel multilingual MRC framework equipped with a Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) to disassociate semantics from syntax in representations learned by multilingual pre-trained models.  Biex jittrasferixxu espliċitament biss l-għarfien semantiku lejn il-lingwa fil-mira, qed nipproponu żewġ gruppi ta’ telf imfassla apposta għall-kodifikazzjoni semantika u sintattika u d-diżantegrazzjoni. Riżultati esperimentali fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta tal-MRC multilingwi (jiġifieri XQuAD, MLQA, u TyDi QA) juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost tagħna fuq mudelli bbażati fuq mBERT u XLM-100.', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczne, wstępnie przeszkolone modele są w stanie zero-shot transferować wiedzę z bogatych zasobów do języków niskich zasobów w zrozumieniu odczytu maszynowego (MRC). Jednak nieodłączne rozbieżności językowe w różnych językach mogą spowodować, że rozszerzenia odpowiedzi przewidywane przez transfer zero-shot naruszają ograniczenia składni języka docelowego. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy wielojęzyczny framework MRC wyposażony w syjamski model rozłączenia semantycznego (S2DM) w celu oddzielenia semantyki od składni w reprezentacjach nauczonych przez wielojęzyczne modele wstępnie trenowane. Aby jednoznacznie przenieść do języka docelowego tylko wiedzę semantyczną, proponujemy dwie grupy strat dostosowane do kodowania semantycznego i składniowego oraz rozłączania. Wyniki eksperymentalne na trzech wielojęzycznych zbiorach danych MRC (tj. XQuAD, MLQA i TyDi QA) pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia w stosunku do modeli opartych na mBERT i XLM-100.', 'sr': 'Višejezički predobučeni modeli mogu da prebace znanje od bogatih resursa na jezike niske resurse u razumijevanju mašinskih čitanja (MRC). Međutim, postojeće lingvističke neslaganosti na različitim jezicima mogle bi da odgovore na prostore predviđene od strane transfera nule pucnjave prekršavaju sintaktičke ograničenja ciljnog jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi multijezički okvir MRC-a koji je opremljen Siamejskim semantičkim modelom dezanalizacije (S2DM) da dezsociiše semantike iz sintakse u predstavljanju koje su naučili multijezički predobučeni modeli. Da bismo se pojasno prebacili samo semantičko znanje na ciljni jezik, predlažemo dve grupe gubitka koje su pripremljene za semantičko i sintaktičko kodiranje i raspuštanje. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri multijezičke MRC dataset (tj. XQuAD, MLQA i TyDi QA) pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa na modelima baziranim na mBERT i XLM-100.', 'ro': 'Modelele multilingve pre-instruite sunt capabile să transfere cunoștințe zero-shot de la limbi bogate-resurse la limbi cu resurse scăzute în înțelegerea mașinii de citit (MRC). Cu toate acestea, discrepanțele lingvistice inerente în diferite limbi ar putea face ca intervalele de răspuns anticipate de transfer zero-shot să încalce constrângerile sintactice ale limbii țintă. În această lucrare, propunem un nou cadru multilingv MRC echipat cu un Model Siamez Semantic Disentanglement (S2DM) pentru a disocia semantica de sintaxa în reprezentările învățate de modele multilingve pre-instruite. Pentru a transfera explicit doar cunoștințele semantice în limba țintă, propunem două grupuri de pierderi adaptate pentru codificarea semantică și sintactică și dezcunoașterea. Rezultatele experimentale pe trei seturi de date multilingve MRC (adică XQuAD, MLQA și TyDi QA) demonstrează eficacitatea abordării propuse în raport cu modelele bazate pe mBERT și XLM-100.', 'sv': 'Flerspråkiga pre-utbildade modeller kan noll-shot överföra kunskap från rika resurser till lågresursspråk i maskinläsförståelse (MRC). Däremot kan inneboende språkliga skillnader i olika språk göra att svarspann förutspådda av nollskottsöverföring bryter mot syntaktiska begränsningar för målspråket. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt flerspråkigt MRC-ramverk utrustat med en siamesisk semantisk Disentanglement Model (S2DM) för att skilja semantik från syntax i representationer som lärts av flerspråkiga pre-utbildade modeller. För att explicit överföra endast semantisk kunskap till målspråket föreslår vi två grupper av förluster anpassade för semantisk och syntaktisk kodning och desintenglement. Experimentella resultat på tre flerspråkiga MRC-datauppsättningar (dvs XQuAD, MLQA och TyDi QA) visar effektiviteten av vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt jämfört med modeller baserade på mBERT och XLM-100.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු මොඩේල් සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200d නමුත්, වෙනස් භාෂාවල් වල ඉන්නත් භාෂාවික වෙනස් වෙනස් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න පුළුවන් ශූන්ය වෙනස් විසි මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ සියාමිස් සෙමැන්ටික් විශාල විශාල විධානයක් සඳහා සියාමිස් සෙමාන්ටික් විශාල විධානයක් සඳහා සිමාන්තික සි ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් සෙමැන්ටික් දන්නවම් ඉලක්ෂ භාෂාවට විතරයි, අපි සෙමැන්ටික් සහ සංකේතික සංකේතනය සහ විනාශ කරණය සඳහා  ගොඩක් භාෂාවික MRC දත්ත සේට් තුනක් ගැන පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Multilingual pre-trained models are able to zero-shot transfer knowledge from rich-resource to low-resource languages in machine reading comprehension (MRC).  Si kastaba ha ahaatee takoorida luuqadaha ku qoran oo luuqado kala duduwan waxay ka jawaabi karaan jasiinta laga soo hor jeedo wareejinta jimicsiga nuurka ah, waxayna xadgudbaan xadhka luqada waxqabadka. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal warqad ah oo luuqado kala duduwan oo MRC ah oo ay leedahay qoraal Siamese Semantic Disentation Model (S2DM) si aan u kala soocno semantics xagga syntax in loo barto noocyo kala duduwan luuqado kala duduwan. Si bayaan loogu soo wareejiyo aqoonta semantika oo kaliya luqada goalka, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in laba koox oo khasaaro ah oo la koobay koox koox koox ah oo la koobo kooxda iyo kooxda kooxda kooxda iyo isbitaalka iyo cudurada. Imtixaanka waxaa ku qoran saddex samooyin oo luuqado kala duduwan oo MRC (tusaale ahaan XQuAD, MLQA iyo TyDi QA) waxay muujiyaan effektada qaababka lagu soo jeeday samooyin ka soo jeeda samooyinka mBERT iyo XLM-100 saleysan.', 'ur': 'Multilingual pre-trained models are able to zero-shot transfer knowledge from rich-resource to low-resource languages in machine reading comprehension (MRC). لیکن، مختلف زبانوں میں مختلف زبان کی مختلف اختلاف کی وجہ سے صفر-شٹ انتقال کے ذریعہ سے پیش بینی کی جگہ کی جگہ پوری کرسکتی ہے کہ موجود زبان کی سینٹاکتیک محدودیتیاں بغاوت کرتی ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نوم multilingual MRC frameworks کی پیشنهاد کریں جو سیامی سیمانتی سیمانٹی ڈیسانٹ\u200cگلنٹ موڈل (S2DM) سے سینٹکس سے سیمانٹیکوں کو دھوکا دینے کے لئے بہت سی زبان کی پیش آموزش کی موڈل سے سکھایا گیا ہے۔ صرف سیمانٹیکی علم کو موجود زبان کی طرف منتقل کرنے کے لئے، ہم دو گروہوں کے خسارہ کا پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو سیمانٹیکی اور سینکٹیکی کوڈینگ اور منتقل کے لئے تدبیر کئے گئے ہیں. تین multilingual MRC datasets (یعنی XQuAD, MLQA, اور Tydi QA) پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ mBERT اور XLM-100 پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں ہماری پیشنهاد کی تقریبا کے مطابق موڈل پر۔', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் சூழ்நிலையிலிருந்து சிறிய மூலத்திலிருந்து குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகளிலிருந்து சிறிய மூ ஆயினும், உள்ளமைந்த மொழிகளில் உள்ள மொழியின் வேறுபாடுகள் பூஜ்ஜியம் சுட்டி மாற்றுதல் மூலம் எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட ஸ்பென்ஸ் மாற்று இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய பல மொழி மொழி MRC சட்டத்திற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், ஒரு Siamese Semantic Disentation Model (S2DM) பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, பல மொழி முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள குறிப்பிட்ட மொழிக்கு மட்டும் பெரிய அறிவு மட்டும் மாற்ற வேண்டுமானால், நாம் பாதிப்பு மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு குறியீட்டு மற்றும மூன்று பல மொழி MRC தரவுத்தளத்தின் முடிவுகள் (எ. கா. XQuAD, MLQA, மற்றும் TyDi QA) MBERT மற்றும் XLM-100 அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரிகளை அடிப்படையில் நம் பரிந்துரைய ச', 'uz': "Bir nechta tildan oldin ishlatilgan modellar taʼminlovchi kompyuterni o'qishga (MRC) o'qish kompyuterda hech narsa yoʻqolishi mumkin. Lekin, boshqa tillarda ichki tillar o'zgarishda o'zgarishga ishlatilgan spanning javob berishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda biz bir necha tilda o'rganilgan muloqat MRC freymi, Siamese Semantic Disentation Model (S2DM) bilan imkoniyatlarni bir necha tilda o'rganish modellaridan foydalanadigan semantika o'zgarishga ega qilamiz. Kodlash tiliga faqat semantik ta'limni o'zgartirish uchun biz semantik va syntactic kodlash uchun ikki guruhni o'zgartiradik. Taʼminlovchi natijalari mBERT va XLM-100 asosida uchta tilli MRC maʼlumotlar tarkibida (m.g. XQuAD, MLQA va TyDi QA) modellarimizning effektligini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình đa ngôn ngữ được đào tạo sẵn có khả năng truyền từ đa nguồn tới ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên trong việc thấu hiểu máy (MRC). Tuy nhiên, sự khác biệt ngôn ngữ khác nhau gắn liền có thể làm cho nhịp trống dự đoán từ việc chuyển phát bắn không vi phạm giới hạn cú pháp của ngôn ngữ đích. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ sở chụp cộng hưởng từ nhiều loại có thiết bị cảm biến ảo ảo (S2DM) để tách ngữ pháp nhân tạo từ các mô tả được học từ các mô- đun mẫu đã được đào tạo sẵn. Để trao chỉ rõ ràng kiến thức ngữ pháp cho ngôn ngữ đối tượng, chúng tôi đề nghị hai nhóm thua dựa vào ngữ pháp và cú pháp và sự phức tạp. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên ba tập tin MRC đa dạng (tức là XQurad, MLQA, và TyDi QA) đã chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp ưa thích của chúng ta với các mô hình dựa trên mBERT và XLM-100.', 'bg': 'Многоезичните предварително обучени модели могат да прехвърлят знания от езици с богати ресурси към езици с ниски ресурси в областта на машинното четене (МРС). Въпреки това, присъщите лингвистични несъответствия в различните езици могат да накарат интервалите на отговорите, прогнозирани чрез нулев трансфер, да нарушат синтактичните ограничения на целевия език. В настоящата статия ние предлагаме нова многоезична рамка на МРС, оборудвана със сиамски модел на семантично разстояние (S2DM), за да разграничи семантиката от синтаксиса в репрезентациите, научени от многоезични предварително обучени модели. За да прехвърлим изрично само семантични знания на целевия език, предлагаме две групи загуби, съобразени със семантично и синтактично кодиране и разединяване. Експерименталните резултати на три многоезични масиви от данни за МРС (т.е. XQuAD, MLQA и TyDi QA) демонстрират ефективността на предлагания от нас подход върху модели, базирани на mBERT и XLM-100.', 'nl': 'Meertalige voorgetrainde modellen zijn in staat om kennis over te dragen van rich-resource naar low-resource talen in machineleesbegrip (MRC). Echter, inherente taalverschillen in verschillende talen kunnen ervoor zorgen dat antwoorden die worden voorspeld door zero-shot overdracht, syntactische beperkingen van de doeltaal schenden. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw meertalig MRC-framework voor dat uitgerust is met een Siamese Semantic Disanglement Model (S2DM) om semantiek te dissocialiseren van syntaxis in representaties geleerd door meertalige voorgetrainde modellen. Om alleen semantische kennis expliciet over te dragen naar de doeltaal, stellen we twee verliesgroepen voor op semantische en syntactische codering en ontkoppeling. Experimentele resultaten op drie meertalige MRC datasets (XQuAD, MLQA en TyDi QA) tonen de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak ten opzichte van modellen op basis van mBERT en XLM-100 aan.', 'hr': 'Većina jezičkih predobučenih modela uspijevaju prenijeti znanje bez pucnjave iz bogatskih resursa na jezike niskih resursa u razumijevanju čitanja strojeva (MRC). Međutim, postojeće lingvističke neslaganosti na različitim jezicima mogle bi odgovoriti na mjesta predviđene od strane transfera nule pucnjave prekršavajući sintaktičke ograničenja ciljnog jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi multijezički okvir MRC-a opremljen sa Siamejskim semantičkim modelom dezantalizacije (S2DM) kako bi dezsociirali semantike iz sintakse u predstavljanju koje su naučili multijezički predobučeni modeli. Da bismo objašnjenje prenijeli samo semantičko znanje na ciljni jezik, predlažemo dvije grupe gubitka prilagođenih za semantičko i sintaktičko kodiranje i raspadanje. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri multijezičke MRC dataset (tj. XQuAD, MLQA i TyDi QA) pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa na modelima baziranim na mBERT i XLM-100.', 'da': 'Flersprogede prætrænede modeller er i stand til nul-shot overføre viden fra rige ressourcer til lav-ressource sprog i maskinlæseforståelse (MRC). Imidlertid kunne iboende sproglige uoverensstemmelser på forskellige sprog få svarspænder forudset af nulskudsoverførsel til at overtræde syntaktiske begrænsninger i målsproget. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny flersproget MRC ramme udstyret med en siamesisk Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) til at adskille semantik fra syntaks i repræsentationer lært af flersprogede prætrænede modeller. For eksplicit at overføre kun semantisk viden til målsproget, foreslår vi to grupper af tab skræddersyet til semantisk og syntaktisk kodning og adskillelse. Eksperimentelle resultater på tre flersprogede MRC datasæt (dvs. XQuAD, MLQA og TyDi QA) viser effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang i forhold til modeller baseret på mBERT og XLM-100.', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige vortrainierte Modelle sind in der Lage, Wissen von Rich-Resource-Sprachen auf ressourcenarme Sprachen im maschinellen Leseverstehen (MRC) zu übertragen. Allerdings könnten inhärente sprachliche Diskrepanzen in verschiedenen Sprachen dazu führen, dass Antwortspannen, die durch Zero-Shot Transfer vorhergesagt werden, syntaktische Einschränkungen der Zielsprache verletzen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuartiges mehrsprachiges MRC-Framework vor, das mit einem Siamesischen Semantic Disanglement Model (S2DM) ausgestattet ist, um Semantik und Syntax in Repräsentationen zu dissoziieren, die von mehrsprachigen vortrainierten Modellen gelernt wurden. Um ausschließlich semantisches Wissen explizit in die Zielsprache zu übertragen, schlagen wir zwei Gruppen von Verlusten vor, die auf semantische und syntaktische Codierung und Disentanglation zugeschnitten sind. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an drei mehrsprachigen MRC-Datensätzen (XQuAD, MLQA und TyDi QA) belegen die Effektivität unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes gegenüber Modellen basierend auf mBERT und XLM-100.', 'id': 'Model berbagai bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya mampu memindahkan pengetahuan nol dari sumber daya kaya ke bahasa sumber daya rendah dalam pemahaman pembacaan mesin (MRC). Namun, perbedaan bahasa yang ada dalam bahasa yang berbeda bisa membuat jangkauan jawaban yang diprediksi oleh transfer 0-shot melanggar batas sintaksi bahasa sasaran. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian MRC berbagai bahasa yang baru yang dipenuhi dengan Model Disentanglement Semantic Siamese (S2DM) untuk mengasingkan semantik dari sintaks dalam represisi yang belajar oleh model pre-terlatih berbagai bahasa. Untuk secara eksplicit hanya memindahkan pengetahuan semantis ke bahasa sasaran, kami mengusulkan dua kelompok kerugian yang disesuaikan untuk pengekodan semantis dan sintaksi dan penyelesaian. Hasil eksperimental pada tiga set data MRC berbagai bahasa (i.e., XQuAD, MLQA, dan TyDi QA) menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kami yang diusulkan atas model berdasarkan mBERT dan XLM-100.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای پیش\u200cآموزش\u200cهای زیادی زبان می\u200cتوانند از منابع ثروتمند به زبان\u200cهای کم منابع در درک خواندن ماشین (MRC) دانش\u200cهای صفر را انتقال دهند. با این حال، اختلافات زبان\u200cشناسی در زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی می\u200cتواند با تغییر تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی سینتیکی زبان هد در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب MRC بسیاری از زبان\u200cهای زیادی که با یک مدل سیامی سیامی Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) تجهیز شده است تا سیمانی\u200cها را از سینتکس در نمایش\u200cهای زیادی که توسط مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cشده\u200cاند نابود کند. برای انتقال صریح دانش semantic only to the target language, we propose two groups of losses tailored for semantic and syntactic encoding and disentanglement. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای MRC multilingual (i.e. XQuAD, MLQA, and Tydi QA) نشان می\u200cدهند فعالیت دستور پیشنهاد ما بر مدل\u200cهای بنیاد mBERT و XLM-100.', 'af': "Veelvuldige voorafgeleerde modele kan nul-skoot oordrag kennis van ryk-hulpbron na lae-hulpbron tale in masjien lees verstaan (MRC). Alhoewel, die inherende lingwisiese verskillighede in verskillende tale kan antwoord spans maak wat deur nul-skoot oordrag gevorderde sintaktiese beheinings van die doel taal gevolg word. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n roman multilingual MRC raamwerk wat met 'n Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) beskikbaar is om semantieke te dissocieer van sintaks in voorstellings geleer deur multilingual voor-opgeleer modele. Om net semantiese kennis na die doel taal te oordra, voorstel ons twee groepe van verlies wat geprop is vir semantiese en sintaktiese enkodering en ontsondering. Eksperimentale resultate op drie multilinguele MRC datastelle (bv. XQuAD, MLQA en TyDi QA) wys die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang oor modele gebaseer op mBERT en XLM-100.", 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha nyingi zilizofunzwa vimeweza kuhamisha maarifa yenye risasi sifuri kutoka rasilimali zenye utajiri hadi lugha ndogo ya rasilimali kwa kusoma kompyuta ya mashine (MRC). Hata hivyo, utofauti wa lugha yenyewe katika lugha tofauti unaweza kuwa na majibu yaliyotabiriwa na usafirishaji wa risasi sifuri unavunja vikwazo vya ushirikiano wa lugha inayolenga. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa riwaya wa MRC wa lugha mbalimbali unaoandaliwa na Modeli ya Kuzungumza na Semantic (S2DM) ili kutofautisha semantika kutoka kwenye kodi katika uwakilishi uliojifunza na mifano ya mafunzo ya lugha mbalimbali. Ili kwa uwazi kuhamisha maarifa ya kimapenzi pekee kwa lugha ya lengo, tunapendekeza makundi mawili ya kupoteza kwa ajili ya kupunguzwa kwa sekunda na ushirikiano na kupunguzwa. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na seti tatu za data za MRC kwa lugha mbalimbali (yaani XQuAD, MLQA na TyDi QA) yanaonyesha ufanisi wa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa kupitia mifano inayotokana na mBERT na XLM-100.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe dilli öňden eğlenen nusgalar baý-resurslardan iň az resurslar dilinden (MRC) bilgileri nul atyp biler. Ýöne, başga dillerde esasy diller bolan lingwistiki nähili göçürmek üçin 0-atly göçürmek üçin janlaşdyrylyp biler. Bu kağıtda, bir çoklu dilli MRC çerçevesi Siamese Semantik Disentanglement Modeli (S2DM) bilen öwrenmiş çoklu dilli öňündeki modeller tarapyndan semantikleri çykarmak üçin teklif ediyoruz. Diňe semantik bilgi maksady diline geçirmek üçin semantik we sintaktik kodlemek we çykarmak üçin düzülen iki topar zehirlenýäni teklip edýäris. 3-nji dilli MRC veri setirlerinde örän netijesi (mysal. XQuAD, MLQA, we TyDi QA) mBERT we XLM-100 daýanýan nusgalarymyzyň täsirini görkez.', 'sq': 'Modelet shumëgjuhësore të trajnuara janë në gjendje të transferojnë njohuri zero-shot nga burime të pasura në gjuhë me burime të ulëta në kuptimin e leximit të makinave (MRC). Megjithatë, mospërputhjet gjuhësore natyrore në gjuhë të ndryshme mund të bëjnë zgjatjet e përgjigjeve të parashikuara nga transferimi zero-shot shkeljnë kufizimet sintaktike të gjuhës objektive. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një kuadër të ri MRC shumëgjuhës të pajisur me një model Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) për të shkëputur semantikën nga sintaksi në përfaqësimet e mësuara nga modele shumëgjuhëse të paratrajnuar. Për të transferuar shprehësisht vetëm njohurinë semantike në gjuhën e objektivit, ne propozojmë dy grupe humbje të përshtatshme për kodimin semantik dhe sintaktik dhe shpërndarjen. Rezultatet eksperimentale në tre grupe të dhënash shumëgjuhësore MRC (pra, XQuAD, MLQA dhe TyDi QA) demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar ndaj modeleve bazuar në mBERT dhe XLM-100.', 'am': 'ከሀብታ-resource ወደ ታናሹ የቋንቋዎች ቋንቋዎች በመሳሪያው አካባቢ (MRC) እውቀትን በzero-shot ሊለውጥ ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ የሚኖረው የቋንቋ ጥቃት በzero-shoot የተለወጠውን ስፓኖችን ሊመልስ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሲያሜስ ሴሜንቲካዊ አካላንድ (S2DM) የተዘጋጀውን የሲንካክስክ እና በብዙ ቋንቋ ተማሪ ሞዴል በተማረ መልዕክቶች ላይ የተለየውን የረኀላፊ MRC ፍሬሜክራሽን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ To explicitly transfer only semantic knowledge to the target language, we propose two groups of losses tailored for semantic and syntactic encoding and disentanglement.  በሦስት ብልቋዊ MRC ዳታተሮች (ምናልባት XQuAD, MLQA እና TyDi QA) የሞክራዊ ፍጻሜዎች mBERT እና XLM-100 በተመሳሳይ የሞክራችን ሥርዓት ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Բազմալեզու նախապատրաստված մոդելները կարողանում են զրոյից տեղափոխել գիտելիքը հարուստ ռեսուրսներից ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուներին մեքենային կարդալու ընկալում (ՄՌԿ). Այնուամենայնիվ, տարբեր լեզուներում գոյություն ունեցող լեզվաբանական տարբերությունները կարող են ստիպել, որ զրոյական կրակի փոխանցման միջոցով կանխատեսված պատասխանների տարածությունը խախտում է նպատակային լեզվի սինտակտիկ սահմանափակու Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր բազլեզու ՄՌԿ-ի շրջանակը, որը պատրաստված է սիամական սեմանտիկ բաժանման մոդելի (S2DM), որպեսզի բաժանի սեմանտիկան սինտաքսից ներկայացումներում, որոնք սովորվել են բազլեզու նախապատրաստված մոդելների միջոցով: Որպեսզի միայն սեմանտիկ գիտելիքները փոխանցվեն նպատակային լեզվին, մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու կորստի խմբեր, որոնք պատրաստված են սեմանտիկ և սինտատիկ կոդավորման և բաժանման համար: Երեք բազլեզու ՄՌԿ տվյալների (այսինքն XQUADը, MLQA-ը և TyDi QA-ը) փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկած մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը mBER-ի և XLM-100 հիմնված մոդելների վրա:', 'ko': '기계독해(MRC)에서 다국어 사전 훈련 모델은 지식을 풍부한 자원에서 낮은 자원으로 옮길 수 있다.그러나 서로 다른 언어의 고유한 언어 차이는 제로 렌즈 이동 예측의 답안 경계를 목표 언어의 문법적 제약에 위반할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 다언어 MRC 프레임워크를 제시했다. 이 프레임워크는 샴로의 의미 풀이 얽매임 모델(S2DM)을 갖추고 다언어 예훈련 모델 학습의 표현에서 문법에서 의미를 분리하는 데 사용된다.의미 지식을 목표 언어로 명확하게 옮기기 위해 우리는 두 그룹이 의미와 문법 코드와 얽힌 손실을 전문적으로 제기했다.세 개의 다국어 MRC 데이터 집합(즉 XQuad, MLQA와 TyDiQA)에서의 실험 결과는 우리가 제시한 방법이 mBERT와 XLM-100을 바탕으로 하는 모델에서의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'bn': 'পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল সমৃদ্ধ সম্পদ থেকে কম সম্পদ ভাষায় জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করতে পারে (এমআরসি)। তবে ভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষার মধ্যে ভাষার বৈষম্যের সাথে সাড়া দিতে পারে যে শূন্য গুলি পরিবর্তনের দ্বারা ধারণা করা হয়েছে সেই স্পেন এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মাল্টিভাষায় এমআরসি ফ্রেমের প্রস্তাব করছি যা সিয়ামের সেম্যান্টিক ডিস্টেনগ্লেন্ডিং মডেল (এস২ডিএম) দিয়ে একটি সিন্ট্যাক্স থেকে সিন্টেক্ পরিষ্কারভাবে শুধুমাত্র সামান্যিক জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করার জন্য, আমরা দুটি দলের ক্ষতির প্রস্তাব করছি যারা সেমান্টিক এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কো তিনটি বহুভাষায় এমআরসি ডাটাসেট (যেমন এক্সোয়াড, এমএলকিয়া এবং টাইডি কিউ) নিয়ে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি এমবের্টি এবং এক্সএলএম-১০০', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil öyrənmiş modellər maşın oxuması anlaşılması (MRC) içində baxımından düşük ressurs dillərinə sıfır-fəsad elmi almağa qadir olar. Lakin, müxtəlif dillərdə olan dillərin müxtəlif fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli olmaqla, sıfır-fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli dillərin məqsəd dilinin sintaktik fərqli hüquqlarını təsdiqlə Bu kağızda, çoxlu dilli MRC framework ünü Siamlı Semantik Disentanglement Modeli (S2DM) ilə birləşdirilmiş, çoxlu dilli öyrənmiş modellərdən öyrənmiş nümunələr üçün sintaksidən semantik dağıtmaq üçün təklif edirik. Sadece semantik bilgiləri məqsəd dilinə göndərmək üçün, semantik, sintaktik kodlama və çəkilmə üçün müəyyən edilmiş iki dəstə zərəri təklif edirik. Üç dil çoxlu MRC veri qurğularının (i.e. XQuAD, MLQA və TyDi QA) təklif etdiyimiz metodların mBERT və XLM-100 üzərində qurulduğumuz modellərin etkinliğini göstərir.', 'bs': 'Mnogjezički predobučeni modeli mogu prenijeti znanje na nulu od bogatskih resursa na jezike niskih resursa u razumijevanju čitanja mašina (MRC). Međutim, postojeće lingvističke neslaganja na različitim jezicima mogle bi odgovoriti na mjesta predviđene premještajem nule pucnjave prekršavajući sintaktičke ograničenja ciljnog jezika. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi multijezički MRC okvir opremljen sa Siamejskim semantičkim modelom dezanalizacije (S2DM) da dezsociišemo semantike iz sintakse u predstavljanju koje su naučili multijezički predobučeni modeli. Da bismo se pojasno prebacili samo semantičko znanje na ciljni jezik, predlažemo dvije grupe gubitka koje su pripremljene za semantičko i sintaktičko kodiranje i raspadanje. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri multijezičke MRC dataset (tj. XQuAD, MLQA i TyDi QA) pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa na modelima baziranim na mBERT i XLM-100.', 'ca': "Els models multilingües pré-entrenats són capaços de transferir coneixements a zero de recursos rics a llengües de baix recursos en la comprensió de lectura màquina (MRC). Tot i així, les discrepancies lingüístices inherents en diferents llengües podrien fer que la diferència de resposta predida per transfer ència de fotografies zero viola les restriccions sinàctiques del llenguatge alvo. In this paper, we propose a novel multilingual MRC framework equipped with a Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) to disassociate semantics from syntax in representations learned by multilingual pre-trained models.  Per transferir explícitament només el coneixement semàntic a la llengua d'objectiu, proposem dos grups de pèrdues adaptats a la codificació semàntica i sinàctica i la desseparació. Els resultats experimentals de tres conjunts de dades multilingües de cMR (i.e., XQuAD, MLQA i TyDi QA) demostren l'eficacia del nostre enfocament proposat sobre models basats en mBERT i XLM-100.", 'fi': 'Monikieliset esikoulutetut mallit pystyvät siirtämään tietoa koneellisen lukuymmärryksen (MRC) avulla nollalaukauksella rikkaista resursseista vähäresurssisiin kieliin. Eri kielten kielelliset eroavuudet voivat kuitenkin saada nollalaukauksen siirrolla ennakoidut vastausalueet rikkomaan kohdekielen syntaktisia rajoituksia. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta monikielistä MRC-viitekehystä, joka on varustettu Siamilaisen Semanttisen Disentanglementin Mallilla (S2DM) semantiikan erottamiseksi syntaksista monikielisten esikoulutettujen mallien avulla opituissa representaatioissa. Jotta kohdekielelle voitaisiin siirtää vain semanttista tietoa, ehdotamme kahta semanttista ja syntaktista koodausta ja purkamista varten räätälöityä häviöryhmää. Kokeelliset tulokset kolmesta monikielisestä MRC-aineistosta (XQuAD, MLQA ja TyDi QA) osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden mBERT- ja XLM-100-mallien suhteen.', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčné předškolené modely jsou schopny přenášet znalosti z bohatých zdrojů do jazyků s nízkými zdroji v porozumění strojovému čtení (MRC). Nicméně inherentní jazykové nesrovnalosti v různých jazycích by mohly způsobit, že rozpětí odpovědí předpovídané nulovým přenosem porušuje syntaktická omezení cílového jazyka. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový vícejazyčný MRC framework vybavený siamským sémantickým disanglementovým modelem (S2DM), který odděluje sémantiku od syntaxe v reprezentacích naučených vícejazyčnými předškolenými modely. Abychom explicitně přenášeli do cílového jazyka pouze sémantické znalosti, navrhujeme dvě skupiny ztrát přizpůsobené sémantickému a syntaktickému kódování a dezapletení. Experimentální výsledky na třech vícejazyčných MRC datových sadách (tj. XQuAD, MLQA a TyDi QA) demonstrují efektivitu našeho navrhovaného přístupu oproti modelům založeným na mBERT a XLM-100.', 'et': 'Mitmekeelsed eelnevalt koolitatud mudelid suudavad masinlugemise mõistmise (MRC) teadmisi mitmekeelselt üle kanda vähese ressursiga keeltest. Kuid erinevate keelte keelelised erinevused võivad põhjustada, et null-shot-ülekandega prognoositavad vastused rikuvad sihtkeele süntaktilisi piiranguid. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse mitmekeelse MRC raamistiku, mis on varustatud siaami semantilise lahutamise mudeliga (S2DM), et lahutada semantika süntaksist mitmekeelsete eelkoolitud mudelitega õppitud representatsioonides. Et sihtkeelde selgesõnaliselt edastada ainult semantilisi teadmisi, pakume välja kaks kaotusrühma, mis on kohandatud semantiliseks ja süntaktiliseks kodeerimiseks ja lahutamiseks. Kolme mitmekeelse MRC andmekogumi (st XQuAD, MLQA ja TyDi QA) katsetulemused näitavad meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust mBERT ja XLM-100 mudelite suhtes.', 'jv': 'Multi-languang model sing dibutuhe iso ngubah 0-nggawe barang pengguna nggawe barang pengguna-pengguna kuwi nggambar barang manut kanggo kuwi tindakan manut ning basa manut (MPN). politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pentungé iki, kéné supoyo nggawe un barêng multilenguang MPN sing ngewat karo Siamse semanti Disantaglement model kanggo kelas barang kelas semantar dumadhi kanggo alêran nggawe alêran, kita supoyo karo kelas telu kanggo ngerasai semantar lan senjatik nggawe barang kelas. Resulot nang telu akeh akeh langgambar MRK dataset (i.e. XCED, MLqA, lan tydi qA) sing bisa ngomongke efekasi kanggo ngerayakno dhéwé ngerasakno model sing bisa basa mBERT lan XLM-10.', 'ha': "@ info: status Haƙĩƙa, da takanci wanda ke cikin harshen dabam-daban, za'a iya sami matsayin spanni wanda aka yi jinkiri da shi na sifanci don ya ƙetare tsarin suntactic na cikin lugha wanda ake amfani da shi. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani fassarar MRC wanda ke da wata shirin Siamese Semantic Disentation (S2DM) dõmin ya rarrabe semantiki daga syntaxe cikin mataimaki wanda aka sanar da shi na motel masu fasalin multi-lingui. To, in sake ka shige ilimi na semanti kawai zuwa harshen wanda aka yi goani, tuna goyi wa ƙungiyõyi biyu na hasãra wanda aka yi hasãra wa kodi na semantic da syntactic da yin kashẽwa. Matarinta na samun mutane uku na MRC database (misali XQuAD, MLQA, da typDi QA) ya nuna aikin da aka buƙata hanyarmu a kan misãlai masu bincike mBERT da XLM-100.", 'he': 'מודלים רבים מאומנים מראש יכולים להעביר מידע אפס-יריות משאבים עשירים לשפות משאבים נמוכות בהבנת קריאת מכונות (MRC). בכל אופן, הפרעות שפותיות נוכחיות בשפות שונות יכולות לגרום למרחק התשובות שנחזה על ידי העברה של אפס יריות לפרור את ההגבלות הסינטקטיות של שפת המטרה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת MRC רבות שפותית חדשה מוכשרת עם מודל סמנטי סמנטי סיאמי (S2DM) כדי לנתק סמנטיקה מסינטקסית ביציגות שנלמדו על ידי מודלים רבות שפותיים מאומנים מראש. כדי להעביר באופן ברור רק ידע סמנטי לשפה המטרה, אנחנו מציעים שתי קבוצות של אבדות מתאימות לקוד סמנטי וסינטקטי ולהפרידה. תוצאות ניסויים על שלושה קבוצות מידע MRC רבות שפות (כלומר XQuAD, MLQA, וטיידי QA) מראות את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת שלנו על דוגמנים מבוססים על mBERT ו XLM-100.', 'sk': 'Večjezični predhodno usposobljeni modeli lahko ničelno prenašajo znanje iz jezikov z bogatimi viri v jezike z nizkimi viri v strojnem branju (MRC). Vendar pa lahko zaradi neločljivih jezikovnih razlik v različnih jezikih razponi odgovorov, predvideni z ničelnim prenosom, kršijo sintaktične omejitve ciljnega jezika. V prispevku predlagamo nov večjezični okvir MRC, opremljen s siamskim semantičnim razporejanjem modela (S2DM) za ločevanje semantike od sintakse v reprezentacijah, ki jih naučijo večjezični predhodno usposobljeni modeli. Za ekspliciten prenos samo semantičnega znanja v ciljni jezik predlagamo dve skupini izgub, prilagojeni semantičnemu in sintaktičnemu kodiranju in razvezanju. Eksperimentalni rezultati treh večjezičnih podatkovnih nizov MRC (tj. XQuAD, MLQA in TyDi QA) kažejo učinkovitost našega predlaganega pristopa pri modelih, ki temeljijo na mBERT in XLM-100.', 'bo': 'Multilingual pre-trained models are able to zero-shot knowledge from rich-resource to low-resource languages in machine reading comprehension (MRC). ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད In this paper, we propose a novel multilingual MRC framework equipped with a Siamese Semantic Disentanglement Model (S2DM) to disassociate semantics from syntax in representations learned by multilingual pre-trained models. གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་semantic knowledge་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལ་གཅིག་པུ་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་དགོས་ངེད་ཚོའི་ཚོགས་ཁག་གཉིས་འཆར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྐད་ཡིག་གྱི་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་MRC གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གསུམ་གྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བྱ་ཚིག་དག་བརྡ་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Semi-Supervised Formality Style Transfer with Consistency Training', 'ar': 'تقطير المعرفة الهيكلية متعدد الحبيبات لضغط نموذج اللغة', 'fr': 'Distillation de connaissances structurales multi-granularité pour la compression de modèles linguistiques', 'pt': 'Destilação de Conhecimento Estrutural Multigranular para Compressão de Modelos de Linguagem', 'es': 'Destilación de conocimiento estructural de granularidad múltiple para la compresión de modelos', 'ja': '言語モデル圧縮のための多粒度構造知識蒸留', 'zh': '语言模压缩多粒度结构知识', 'hi': 'बहु-ग्रैन्युलैरिटी संरचनात्मक ज्ञान आसवन भाषा मॉडल संपीड़न के लिए', 'ru': 'Мультигранулярная дистилляция структурных знаний для сжатия языковой модели', 'ga': 'Driogadh Eolais Struchtúrtha Il-Granularity le haghaidh Comhbhrú Múnla Teanga', 'el': 'Διαρθρωτική απόσταξη γνώσης πολλαπλών κόκκων για τη συμπίεση προτύπων γλωσσών', 'it': 'Distillazione di conoscenze strutturali multi-granularità per compressione del modello linguistico', 'hu': 'Többszörösségi strukturális tudás desztilláció a nyelvi modell tömörítéséhez', 'ka': 'Multi-Granularity სტრუქტურული მეცნიერების განსხვავება ენის მოდელის კომპრესიისთვის', 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Daugiagranuliarumo struktūrinė žinių distiliacija kalbos modelio kompresijai', 'kk': 'Тіл үлгі компрессиясы үшін көп гранулариялық структуралық білім бөлімі', 'mt': 'Multi-Granularity Structural Knowledge Distillation for Language Model Compression', 'ms': 'Distillasi Pengetahuan Struktur Multi-Granularity untuk Pemampatan Model Bahasa', 'ml': 'ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡില്\u200d പരിഹാരത്തിനുള്ള കൂടുതല്\u200d ഗ്രാന്റലിറ്റി സ്ട്രാക്ട്രൂളിറ്റല്\u200d അറിവ് ഡിസ്റ്റില', 'mn': 'Холбоо загварын даралтын олон гранталист структур мэдлэг халдвар', 'pl': 'Wielogranularność destylacja wiedzy strukturalnej dla kompresji modelu językowego', 'no': 'Multigranularity Strukturelle kunnskap for språk-modellekompresjon', 'ro': 'Distilarea cunoștințelor structurale multi-granularitate pentru compresia modelului lingvistic', 'sr': 'Višegranularnost strukturalne znanja za kompresiju jezičkog modela', 'si': 'Multi- Greunality Struktural KnowKnowKnowness Distiliation for language Model Compression', 'sv': 'Destillation av strukturell kunskap med flera granulariteter för komprimering av språkmodeller', 'so': 'Qaybinta aqoonta dhismaha luuqadda', 'ta': 'மொழி மாதிரி அச்சுறுத்தலுக்கான பல- பெரிய அறிவு திரைமாற்றம்', 'ur': 'Language Model Compression for Multi-Granularity Structureural Knowledge Distillation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hiệu ứng đa đặc biệt Kiến thức phân tách ngôn ngữ học', 'da': 'Multi-Granularity Structural Knowledge Destillation for Sprogmodel Komprimering', 'hr': 'Višegranularnost strukturalne znanja za kompresiju jezičkog modela', 'bg': 'Дестилация на структурни знания за многогранулиране за компресиране на езикови модели', 'nl': 'Multi-Granularity Structural Knowledge Distillation voor Language Model Compression', 'de': 'Multi-Granularität Strukturelle Wissensdestillation für die Komprimierung von Sprachmodellen', 'ko': '언어 모델 압축을 위한 다립도 구조 지식 추출', 'fa': 'تغییر علم ساختاری زیادی برای تعلق مدل زبان', 'id': 'Multi-Granularity Structural Knowledge Distillation for Language Model Compression', 'sw': 'Kugawanywa kwa Miundombinu ya Ujuzi kwa ajili ya Kushinikiza Modeli ya Lugha', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Modeli Sykmak üçin Ululyk Namaýyşy', 'af': 'Stencils', 'sq': 'Multi-Granularity Structural Knowledge Distillation for Language Model Compression', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Լեզու մոդելի կոմպրեսի համար բազմագռանիալ գիտելիքների կառուցվածքային դիստիլացիան', 'az': 'Dil Modeli Komprisyonu üçün çoxlu-Granularity Struktural Bilim İstifadəti', 'bn': 'ভাষা মোডেল কম্পোশনের জন্য বহুগ্রান্ত কৌশলের জ্ঞান ডিস্ট্রিলেশন', 'bs': 'Multigranularnost Strukturalna znanja za kompresiju jezičkog modela', 'ca': 'Distillació del coneixement estructural multigranularitat per a la compressió del model de llenguatge', 'cs': 'Destilace strukturálních znalostí pro kompresi jazykového modelu', 'et': 'Mitme granulaarsusega struktuuriliste teadmiste destilleerimine keelemudeli tihendamiseks', 'fi': 'Monirakeinen rakenteellisen tietämyksen tislaus kielimallin puristukseen', 'jv': 'Multi-granularity', 'sk': 'Destilacija strukturnega znanja z več granularnostmi za stiskanje jezikovnega modela', 'he': 'דיסטיל מידע מבניי רבי-גרנלאריות ללחץ מודל שפה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Multi-Granularity Structural Knowledge Distillation for Language Model Compression'}
{'en': 'Formality style transfer (FST) is a task that involves paraphrasing an informal sentence into a formal one without altering its meaning. To address the data-scarcity problem of existing parallel datasets, previous studies tend to adopt a cycle-reconstruction scheme to utilize additional unlabeled data, where the FST model mainly benefits from target-side unlabeled sentences. In this work, we propose a simple yet effective semi-supervised framework to better utilize source-side unlabeled sentences based on consistency training. Specifically, our approach augments pseudo-parallel data obtained from a source-side informal sentence by enforcing the model to generate similar outputs for its perturbed version. Moreover, we empirically examined the effects of various data perturbation methods and propose effective data filtering strategies to improve our framework. Experimental results on the GYAFC benchmark demonstrate that our approach can achieve state-of-the-art results, even with less than 40% of the parallel data.', 'ar': 'أثار نقل المعرفة إلى نموذج صغير من خلال التقطير اهتمامًا كبيرًا في السنوات الأخيرة. تنقل الأساليب السائدة المعرفة المستمدة من وحدات اللغة أحادية التفصيل (على سبيل المثال ، مستوى الرمز المميز أو مستوى العينة) ، والتي لا تكفي لتمثيل الدلالات الثرية للنص وقد تفقد بعض المعرفة الحيوية. إلى جانب ذلك ، تشكل هذه الأساليب المعرفة كتمثيلات فردية أو تبعيات بسيطة ، متجاهلة العلاقات البنيوية الوفيرة بين التمثيلات الوسيطة. للتغلب على المشكلات ، نقدم إطارًا جديدًا لتقطير المعرفة يجمع تمثيلات وسيطة من تفاصيل دلالات متعددة (على سبيل المثال ، الرموز المميزة والفواصل والعينات) ويشكل المعرفة كعلاقات هيكلية أكثر تعقيدًا محددة على أنها التفاعلات الزوجية والحكمة الثلاثية زوايا هندسية تعتمد على تمثيلات متعددة الحبيبات. علاوة على ذلك ، نقترح استخلاص المعرفة الهيكلية متعددة الحبيبات جيدة التنظيم للطالب بشكل هرمي عبر الطبقات. تظهر النتائج التجريبية لمعيار GLUE أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على طرق التقطير المتقدمة.', 'pt': 'A transferência do conhecimento para um modelo pequeno através da destilação tem despertado grande interesse nos últimos anos. Os métodos predominantes transferem o conhecimento derivado de unidades de linguagem de monogranularidade (por exemplo, nível de token ou nível de amostra), o que não é suficiente para representar a rica semântica de um texto e pode perder algum conhecimento vital. Além disso, esses métodos formam o conhecimento como representações individuais ou suas simples dependências, desprezando abundantes relações estruturais entre representações intermediárias. Para superar os problemas, apresentamos uma nova estrutura de destilação de conhecimento que reúne representações intermediárias de múltiplas granularidades semânticas (por exemplo, tokens, spans e amostras) e forma o conhecimento como relações estruturais mais sofisticadas especificadas como as interações de pares e as de tripletos. ângulos geométricos baseados em representações de multigranularidade. Além disso, propomos destilar o conhecimento estrutural de multigranularidade bem organizado para o aluno hierarquicamente entre camadas. Resultados experimentais no benchmark GLUE demonstram que nosso método supera os métodos avançados de destilação.', 'fr': "Le transfert des connaissances vers un petit modèle par distillation a suscité un vif intérêt ces dernières années. Les méthodes dominantes transfèrent les connaissances dérivées des unités de langage mono-granularité (par exemple, au niveau du jeton ou de l'échantillon), ce qui n'est pas suffisant pour représenter la sémantique riche d'un texte et peut perdre certaines connaissances vitales. En outre, ces méthodes forment la connaissance en tant que représentations individuelles ou leurs dépendances simples, négligeant les relations structurelles abondantes entre les représentations intermédiaires. Pour surmonter les problèmes, nous présentons un nouveau cadre de distillation des connaissances qui rassemble des représentations intermédiaires à partir de granularités sémantiques multiples (par exemple, jetons, portées et échantillons) et forme les connaissances sous forme de relations structurelles plus sophistiquées spécifiées comme les interactions par paires et les triplets- des angles géométriques sages basés sur des représentations multi-granularités. De plus, nous proposons de distiller les connaissances structurales multi-granularité bien organisées à l'étudiant de manière hiérarchique à travers les couches. Les résultats expérimentaux sur le banc d'essai GLUE démontrent que notre méthode surpasse les méthodes de distillation avancées.", 'es': 'La transferencia del conocimiento a un modelo pequeño a través de la destilación ha despertado un gran interés en los últimos años. Los métodos predominantes transfieren el conocimiento derivado de las unidades lingüísticas de granularidad única (por ejemplo, a nivel de token o de muestra), que no es suficiente para representar la rica semántica de un texto y puede perder algunos conocimientos vitales. Además, estos métodos forman el conocimiento como representaciones individuales o sus simples dependencias, descuidando las abundantes relaciones estructurales entre las representaciones intermedias. Para superar los problemas, presentamos un marco de destilación de conocimiento novedoso que reúne representaciones intermedias de múltiples granularidades semánticas (por ejemplo, tokens, vanos y muestras) y forma el conocimiento como relaciones estructurales más sofisticadas especificadas como las interacciones por pares y el triplete ángulos geométricos sabios basados en representaciones de granularidad múltiple. Además, proponemos destilar el conocimiento estructural de multigranularidad bien organizado para el estudiante jerárquicamente a través de las capas. Los resultados experimentales en el punto de referencia GLUE demuestran que nuestro método supera a los métodos de destilación avanzados.', 'ja': '蒸留を通じて小さなモデルに知識を移すことは、近年大きな関心を集めています。 通常の方法は、単粒度言語単位（例えば、トークンレベルまたはサンプルレベル）から導き出された知識を転送し、それはテキストの豊かな意味論を表すのに十分ではなく、いくつかの重要な知識を失う可能性がある。 さらに、これらの方法は、個々の表現またはその単純な依存関係として知識を形成し、中間表現の間の豊富な構造関係を無視する。 問題を克服するために、私たちは、複数のセマンティック粒度（例えば、トークン、スパン、およびサンプル）から中間表現を収集し、多粒度表現に基づくペアワイズ相互作用および三重幾何学的角度として指定されたより洗練された構造関係として知識を形成する新規の知識蒸留フレームワークを提示します。 さらに、組織化された多粒度構造知識を層を超えて階層的に学習者に抽出することを提案します。 グルーベンチマークの実験結果は、当社の方法が先進的な蒸留法よりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '近年以来,因蒸馏移知于小形之中, 行法移单粒度言语单元(如,令牌级样本)生,不足以示富语义,而失其大者也。 此外以知识为个体,或简或恃,忽于中表之富结也。 为此等问,发一新知提炼框架,当框架从数语义粒度(,标记跨度与样本)中收拾中间,以成复杂,指为基于多粒度,三重几何角度。 此外,议将良多粒度结构,提炼成弟子分层。 GLUE准之实验结果表明,优于先进之蒸馏。', 'hi': 'आसवन के माध्यम से एक छोटे से मॉडल में ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करने से हाल के वर्षों में बहुत रुचि बढ़ी है। प्रचलित तरीके मोनो-ग्रैन्युलैरिटी भाषा इकाइयों (जैसे, टोकन-स्तर या नमूना-स्तर) से प्राप्त ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करते हैं, जो किसी पाठ के समृद्ध शब्दार्थ का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए पर्याप्त नहीं है और कुछ महत्वपूर्ण ज्ञान खो सकता है। इसके अलावा, ये विधियां व्यक्तिगत प्रतिनिधित्व या उनकी सरल निर्भरताओं के रूप में ज्ञान का निर्माण करती हैं, मध्यवर्ती प्रतिनिधित्व के बीच प्रचुर मात्रा में संरचनात्मक संबंधों की उपेक्षा करती हैं। समस्याओं को दूर करने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास ज्ञान आसवन रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो कई शब्दार्थ ग्रैन्युलैरिटी (जैसे, टोकन, स्पैन और नमूने) से मध्यवर्ती प्रतिनिधित्व एकत्र करता है और ज्ञान को अधिक परिष्कृत संरचनात्मक संबंधों के रूप में निर्दिष्ट करता है जो जोड़ी-वार इंटरैक्शन और बहु-ग्रैन्युलैरिटी प्रतिनिधित्व के आधार पर त्रिक-वार ज्यामितीय कोणों के रूप में निर्दिष्ट होता है। इसके अलावा, हम परतों में पदानुक्रमित रूप से छात्र को अच्छी तरह से संगठित बहु-ग्रैन्युलैरिटी संरचनात्मक ज्ञान को डिस्टिल करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। GLUE बेंचमार्क पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारी विधि उन्नत आसवन विधियों को मात देती है।', 'ru': 'Передача знаний в небольшую модель с помощью дистилляции вызвала большой интерес в последние годы. Преобладающие методы передают знания, полученные из одногранулярных языковых единиц (например, на уровне токенов или на уровне выборки), что недостаточно для представления богатой семантики текста и может привести к потере некоторых жизненно важных знаний. Кроме того, эти методы формируют знания как индивидуальные представления или их простые зависимости, пренебрегая обильными структурными отношениями между промежуточными представлениями. Чтобы преодолеть проблемы, мы представляем новую структуру дистилляции знаний, которая собирает промежуточные представления из множества семантических зернистостей (например, токенов, пролетов и образцов) и формирует знания как более сложные структурные отношения, определенные как парные взаимодействия и геометрические углы по триплету на основе представлений о множестве зернистостей. Кроме того, мы предлагаем перегонять хорошо организованные многогранные структурные знания студенту иерархически по слоям. Экспериментальные результаты по эталону КЛЕЯ показывают, что наш метод превосходит передовые методы дистилляции.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá an-suim tar éis an t-eolas a aistriú go múnla beag trí dhriogadh. Aistríonn na modhanna atá i réim an t-eolas a fhaightear ó aonaid teanga mhona-granularity (m.sh., leibhéal ton nó leibhéal samplach), nach leor chun shéimeantaic shaibhir téacs a léiriú agus a d’fhéadfadh eolas ríthábhachtach éigin a chailleadh. Thairis sin, cruthaíonn na modhanna seo an t-eolas mar léirithe aonair nó mar a spleáchais shimplí, rud a fhágann faillí i gcaidreamh struchtúrach flúirseach i measc léirithe idirmheánacha. Chun na fadhbanna a shárú, cuirimid creat nua driogtha eolais i láthair a bhailíonn léiriúcháin idirmheánacha ó il-ghráinníní shéimeantacha (m.sh., comharthaí, raonta agus samplaí) agus a fhoirmíonn an t-eolas mar chaidreamh struchtúrach níos sofaisticiúla a shonraítear mar na hidirghníomhaíochtaí péire-ciallmhar agus na hidirghníomhaíochtaí tripleacha. uillinneacha geoiméadracha bunaithe ar léirithe il-granularity. Ina theannta sin, tá sé beartaithe againn an t-eolas struchtúrach il-granularity dea-eagraithe a dhriogadh don mhac léinn go ordlathach trasna sraitheanna. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thagarmharc GLUE go sáraíonn ár modh ardmhodhanna driogtha.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években nagy érdeklődést keltett az ismeretek kisebb modellre történő lepárlással történő átadása. Az elsődleges módszerek átadják a monogranularitás nyelvi egységekből származó ismereteket (pl. token-szint vagy minta-szint), ami nem elegendő egy szöveg gazdag szemantikájának ábrázolásához, és elveszíthet némi létfontosságú ismeretet. Emellett ezek a módszerek egyéni reprezentációként vagy egyszerű függőségeiként alkotják a tudást, figyelmen kívül hagyva a köztes reprezentációk közötti bőséges strukturális kapcsolatokat. A problémák leküzdése érdekében bemutatunk egy új tudás desztillációs keretet, amely többféle szemantikai granularitásból (pl. tokenekből, spanokból és mintákból) származó közbenső reprezentációkat gyűjt össze, és a tudást olyan kifinomultabb strukturális kapcsolatként formálja, mint a páros kölcsönhatások és a háromszoros geometriai szögek, amelyek több granularitás reprezentációkon alapulnak. Ezenkívül javasoljuk a jól szervezett, többszemcsés strukturális ismeretek lepárlását a hallgató hierarchikusan rétegeken át. A GLUE benchmark kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk felülmúlja a fejlett desztillációs módszereket.', 'el': 'Η μεταφορά της γνώσης σε ένα μικρό μοντέλο μέσω απόσταξης έχει προκαλέσει μεγάλο ενδιαφέρον τα τελευταία χρόνια. Οι κυρίαρχες μέθοδοι μεταφέρουν τη γνώση που προέρχεται από γλωσσικές μονάδες μονοκοκκώδους (π.χ. σε επίπεδο σήματος ή δείγματος), η οποία δεν αρκεί για να αναπαραστήσει την πλούσια σημασιολογία ενός κειμένου και μπορεί να χάσει κάποια ζωτική γνώση. Εξάλλου, αυτές οι μέθοδοι διαμορφώνουν τη γνώση ως μεμονωμένες αναπαραστάσεις ή απλές εξαρτήσεις τους, παραμελώντας άφθονες δομικές σχέσεις μεταξύ ενδιάμεσων αναπαραστάσεων. Για να ξεπεραστούν τα προβλήματα, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο απόσταξης γνώσης που συγκεντρώνει ενδιάμεσες αναπαραστάσεις από πολλαπλές σημασιολογικές κοκκοποιότητες (π.χ. μάρκες, περιοχές και δείγματα) και διαμορφώνει τη γνώση ως πιο εξελιγμένες δομικές σχέσεις που καθορίζονται ως οι αλληλεπιδράσεις ζεύγους και οι τρίπτυχες γεωμετρικές γωνίες βασισμένες σε αναπαραστάσεις πολυπλοκότητας. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε την απόσταξη της καλά οργανωμένης πολυκοκκώδους δομικής γνώσης στον φοιτητή ιεραρχικά σε διάφορα στρώματα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο σημείο αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά τις προηγμένες μεθόδους απόσταξης.', 'it': 'Trasferire le conoscenze ad un piccolo modello attraverso la distillazione ha suscitato grande interesse negli ultimi anni. I metodi prevalenti trasferiscono le conoscenze derivate da unità linguistiche mono-granularity (ad esempio, token-level o sample-level), che non è sufficiente a rappresentare la ricca semantica di un testo e può perdere alcune conoscenze vitali. Inoltre, questi metodi formano la conoscenza come rappresentazioni individuali o loro semplici dipendenze, trascurando abbondanti relazioni strutturali tra rappresentazioni intermedie. Per superare i problemi, presentiamo un nuovo framework di distillazione della conoscenza che raccoglie rappresentazioni intermedie da granularità semantiche multiple (ad esempio, token, span e campioni) e forma la conoscenza come relazioni strutturali più sofisticate specificate come le interazioni pair-wise e gli angoli geometrici triplet-wise basati su rappresentazioni multi-granularità. Inoltre, proponiamo di distillare la conoscenza strutturale multi-granularità ben organizzata allo studente gerarchicamente attraverso strati. I risultati sperimentali sul benchmark GLUE dimostrano che il nostro metodo supera i metodi avanzati di distillazione.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების გადატვირთვა პატარა მოდელისთვის განსხვავებით უფრო დისტალაციის ინტერესტის შემდეგ ბოლო წლის შემდეგ. მონო-გრანულაციის ენის ერთეულებიდან (მაგალითად, token-დონე ან sample-დონე) მეცნიერების გადატვირთვას, რომლებიც ტექსტის ბედნიერი სმენტიკების გამოსახულება არ უფრო მხოლოდ და შეიძლება გადარ დამატებით, ეს მეტოვები იქნება ცნობიერებას როგორც ინდიველური გამოსახულებები ან მათი საუკეთესო დასახულებები, რომლებიც უფრო დიდი სტრუქტური შესახე პრობლემების გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პრობლემების განსხვავება, რომელიც მრავალ სმენტიკური გრანულაციის განსხვავებების განსხვავებას (მაგალითად, სიმბოლოები, სიმბოლოები და გრანულაციები) და ახალგაზრდებით უფრო მეტიკური სტრუქტური შესა დამატებით, ჩვენ უნდა გავაკეთებთ სტუდენტირებული მრავალ გრანულაციის სტუდენტიკური ცოდნა სტუდენტების hiერაქტიკურად სტუდენტების სტუდე ექსპერიმენტიური გამოცდილება GLUE ბენქმარკის გამოცდილებაში გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო გავაკეთება განსხვავებული მეთოდი.', 'mk': 'Пренесувањето на знаењето на мал модел преку дистилација предизвика голем интерес во последните години. Prevailing methods transfer the knowledge derived from mono-granularity language units (e.g., token-level or sample-level), which is not enough to represent the rich semantics of a text and may lose some vital knowledge.  Покрај тоа, овие методи го формираат знаењето како индивидуални претставувања или нивни едноставни зависности, заборавајќи ги обучните структурни односи меѓу меѓународните претставувања. За да ги надминеме проблемите, претставуваме нова рамка за дистилација на знаење која собира меѓувремени претставувања од многуте семантични грануларности (на пример, знаци, растојание и примероци) и го формира знаењето како пософистицирани структурни односи спецификувани како паровни интеракции и тројца геометрички агли базирани на мултигрануларности. Покрај тоа, предложуваме да се дестилира добро организираното мултигрануларно структурно знаење на студентот хиерархично преку слоеви. Експерименталните резултати на benchmark GLUE покажуваат дека нашиот метод ги надминува напредните методи на дистилација.', 'ms': 'Memindahkan pengetahuan kepada model kecil melalui penapisan telah meningkatkan minat besar dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Kaedah pemindahan memindahkan pengetahuan yang berasal dari unit bahasa mono-granularity (cth., aras token atau aras sampel), yang tidak cukup untuk mewakili semantik kaya teks dan mungkin kehilangan beberapa pengetahuan penting. Selain itu, kaedah ini membentuk pengetahuan sebagai perwakilan individu atau dependensi sederhana mereka, mengabaikan hubungan struktur yang banyak di antara perwakilan sementara. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mempersembahkan kerangka pengusiran pengetahuan baru yang mengumpulkan perwakilan sementara dari berbilang granulariti semantik (contoh, token, jangkauan dan sampel) dan membentuk pengetahuan sebagai hubungan struktur yang lebih canggih dinyatakan sebagai interaksi pasangan-bijak dan sudut geometri tiga-bijak berdasarkan perwakilan berbilang-granulariti. Selain itu, kami cadangkan pengusiran pengetahuan struktur multi-granularity yang baik-organisasi kepada pelajar secara hierarkis melalui lapisan. Keputusan percubaan pada tanda rujukan GLUE menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melebihi kaedah penyembuhan lanjut.', 'kk': 'Білімдерді өзгерту үшін кішкентай моделіне аудару соңғы жылдарда көп қызықты көтерді. Мәтіннің баяны семантикалық білімдерін монограниялық тіл бірліктерінен аудару әдістерін (мысалы, белгілер деңгейінде немесе үлгілер деңгейінде) аудару мүмкін емес. Бұл мәтіннің баяны семантикалық білімдер Бұл әдістер бұл әдістердің білімі бір-бірінің қарапайым тәуелділіктері ретінде құрылады. Олардың орташа тәуелдіктері арасындағы көптеген құрастық қатынас Мәселелерді көтеру үшін біз білім дипликациялау фреймін таңдап, бірнеше семантикалық грануляриялардан (мысалы, белгілер, спанс және үлгілерден) орташа мәліметтерді жинақтайды, білім екі жағынан келтірілген және көп гранулариялық түрлеріне негізделген үш жағынан геометри Сонымен қатар, біз студенттердің иерархиялық қабаттары бойынша көп гранулариялық құрылғылардың құрылғысын түрлендіру керек. GLUE бағдарламасының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің әдіміміздің көтерілген дистилляциялау әдістерінің жоғарын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Transferring the knowledge to a small model through distillation has raised great interest in recent years.  Naudotieji metodai perduoda žinias, gautas iš vieno granuliarumo kalbos vienetų (pvz., simbolių ar mėginių lygio), kurios nepakanka, kad būtų galima atspindėti turtingą teksto semantiką ir gali prarasti tam tikrų gyvybiškai svarbių žinių. Be to, šie metodai sudaro individualių atstovybių arba jų paprastų priklausomybės žinias, neatsižvelgiant į daugybę struktūrinių tarpinių atstovybių santykių. Siekiant išspręsti problemas, pristatome naują žinių distiliavimo sistemą, kurioje surenkami tarpiniai atstovai iš daugelio semantinių granuliarumų (pvz., žymenų, intervalų ir mėginių) ir sudaromos žinios kaip sudėtingesni struktūriniai santykiai, nurodyti kaip dviejų krypčių sąveika ir trijų krypčių geometriniai kampai, pagrįsti daugelio granuliarumo atstovais. Be to, siūlome gerai organizuotų daugiakalbių struktūrinių žinių distiliavimą studentams hierarchiškai įvairiuose sluoksniuose. Eksperimentiniai GLUE lyginamojo rodiklio rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas viršija pažangius distiliavimo metodus.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийг жижиг загвар руу шилжүүлэх нь сүүлийн жилүүдэд маш их сонирхолтой болсон. Мөн моногранулалтын хэл нэгжээс гарсан мэдлэгийг (жишээ нь, тэмдэгтийн түвшин эсвэл sample-түвшин) шилжүүлэхэд хангалттай зүйл биш, мөн тэмдэгтийн баян үр дүнг илэрхийлж, зарим чухал мэдлэгийг алдах боломжтой. Үүнээс гадна эдгээр арга нь хувийн үзүүлэлт болон энгийн хамааралтай байдлын тухай мэдлэг үүсгэдэг. Бид эдгээр асуудлуудыг даван тулгарахын тулд олон семантийн гранулацийн дундаж үзүүлэлтийг цуглуулдаг шинэ мэдлэг сайжруулах хэлбэрийг олгодог. Мөн мэдлэг нь олон гранулацийн үзүүлэлтийн үндсэн хоорондоо илүү нарийн бүтэц харилцаа болон гурав давхар геометрийн өнцгүүд болгодог. Мөн бид оюутнуудын төлөвлөгөөний олон граннулярын бүтэц мэдлэгийг оюутнуудын төлөвлөгөөний хэмжээнд сайн зохион байгуулсан талаар тайлбарлаж байна. ГЛЕУ багц дээрх туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь хөгжиж буй сайжруулах арга замыг илүүтэй болгодог гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'പരിജ്ഞാനം ഒരു ചെറിയ മോഡലിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നത് അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d വളരെ താല്പര്യമുണ്ട്. മോണോ- ഗ്രാന്റിറ്റി ഭാഷ യൂണിറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ലഭ്യമായ അറിവുകള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഇതിനു പുറമെ, ഈ രീതികള്\u200d വ്യക്തിപരമായ പ്രതിനിധികളെയോ സാധാരണ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതെന്നോ അറിവുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഇടയിലുള്ള പ്രതിന To overcome the problems, we present a novel knowledge distillation framework that gathers intermediate representations from multiple semantic granularities (e.g., tokens, spans and samples) and forms the knowledge as more sophisticated structural relations specified as the pair-wise interactions and the triplet-wise geometric angles based on multi-granularity representations.  അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മള്\u200d നല്ല സംഘടനയുള്ള പല്ലിഗ്രാന്റിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നത് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിക GLUE ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മുന്\u200dഗണന വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്', 'pl': 'Przekazanie wiedzy do małego modelu poprzez destylację wzbudziło duże zainteresowanie w ostatnich latach. Przeważające metody przenoszą wiedzę pochodzącą z jednostek językowych monogranularności (np. na poziomie tokenów lub na poziomie próbki), która nie wystarczy do reprezentowania bogatej semantyki tekstu i może utracić pewną istotną wiedzę. Ponadto metody te kształtują wiedzę jako indywidualne reprezentacje lub ich proste zależności, zaniedbując obfite relacje strukturalne między reprezentacjami pośrednimi. Aby przezwyciężyć te problemy, prezentujemy nowatorski framework destylacji wiedzy, który gromadzi pośrednie reprezentacje z wielu semantycznych granularności (np. tokenów, rozpięć i próbek) i tworzy wiedzę jako bardziej zaawansowane relacje strukturalne określone jako interakcje parowe i trójkąty geometryczne oparte na reprezentacjach wielokranularności. Ponadto proponujemy destylowanie dobrze zorganizowanej wiedzy strukturalnej wielokranularności studentowi hierarchicznie między warstwami. Wyniki eksperymentalne na GLUE pokazują, że nasza metoda przewyższa zaawansowane metody destylacji.', 'mt': 'It-trasferiment tal-għarfien għal mudell żgħir permezz tad-distillazzjoni qajjem interess kbir f’dawn l-a ħħar snin. Metodi preċedenti jittrasferixxu l-g ħarfien derivat minn unitajiet lingwistiċi monogranulari (e ż., livell ta’ token jew livell ta’ kampjun), li mhuwiex biżżejjed biex jirrappreżenta s-semantika rikka ta’ test u jista’ jitlef xi għarfien vitali. Barra minn hekk, dawn il-metodi jiffurmaw l-għarfien bħala rappreżentazzjonijiet individwali jew id-dipendenzi sempliċi tagħhom, filwaqt li jinjoraw relazzjonijiet strutturali abbundanti fost rappreżentazzjonijiet intermedji. Biex jingħelbu l-problemi, nippreżentaw qafas ġdid ta’ distillazzjoni ta’ g ħarfien li jiġbor rappreżentazzjonijiet intermedji minn granularitajiet semantiċi multipli (e ż., tokens, spans u kampjuni) u jifforma l-għarfien bħala relazzjonijiet strutturali aktar sofistikati speċifikati bħala l-interazzjonijiet bejn il-pari u l-angoli ġeometriċi tripliċi bbażati fuq rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ granularità multipla. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu li l-għarfien strutturali organizzat tajjeb dwar il-multigranularità jiġi distillat lill-istudenti b’mod ġerarkiku fis-saffi kollha. Riżultati esperimentali dwar il-punt ta’ riferiment GLUE juru li l-metodu tagħna huwa ogħla minn metodi avvanzati ta’ distillazzjoni.', 'no': 'Overføring av kunnskapen til ein liten modell gjennom distillasjon har økt stor interesse i siste år. Å forhindra metodane å overføra kunnskapen utvikla frå monogranularitetsspråkeeiningar (f.eks. tokennivå eller prøvenivå), som ikkje er nok til å representera rike semantikk av eit tekst og kan mista noko viktig kunnskap. I tillegg er desse metodane kunnskap som individuelle representasjonar eller sine enkle avhengighet, og avbrytar store strukturrelasjonar mellom medlemssrepresentasjonar. For å overvåka problema, presenterer vi eit nytt kunnskapsdistillasjonsrammeverk som samler mellom fleire semantiske granularitier (f.eks. teikn, mellomrom og prøver) og formerer kunnskapen som meir sofistikerte strukturrelasjonar spesifisert som samarbeidet på pare og trekant geometriske vinkelen basert på fleire granularitetsrepresentasjonar. I tillegg foreslår vi å distillere den godt organiserte multigranularitetsstrukturelle kunnskapen til studenten hierarkisk gjennom lag. Eksperimentale resultat på GLUE-benchmarket viser at metoden vårt utfører avanserte destilmetodar.', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje znanja na mali model iz destilacije povećalo je veliki interes u poslednjih godina. Prebacivanje metoda prebacivanja znanja iz jednostavnih jedinica za monogranularnost (npr. nivo znakova ili nivo uzoraka), koja nije dovoljna da predstavlja bogate semantike teksta i može izgubiti neke vitalne znanje. Osim toga, ove metode formiraju znanje kao individualne predstave ili njihove jednostavne zavisnosti, zaboravljajući ogromne strukturne odnose među prosječnim predstavljanjima. Da bi prevladali probleme, predstavljamo novi okvir destilacije znanja koji skuplja prosječne predstave od višesemantičnih granularitija (npr. znakova, spanova i uzorka) i formiramo znanje kao sofisticiranije strukturne odnose koje su određene kao interakcije na parovima i trostrukim geometrijskim uglovima bazirane na višegranularnim predstavljanjima. Osim toga, predlažemo destilaciju dobro organizovanog multigranularnog strukturnog znanja studentima hijerarhički preko slojeva. Eksperimentalni rezultati na granici GLUE pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi napredne metode destilacije.', 'ro': 'Transferul cunoștințelor la un model mic prin distilare a ridicat un mare interes în ultimii ani. Metodele predominante transferă cunoștințele derivate din unitățile lingvistice mono-granularitate (de exemplu, nivel de token sau nivel de eșantion), ceea ce nu este suficient pentru a reprezenta semantica bogată a unui text și poate pierde unele cunoștințe vitale. În plus, aceste metode formează cunoaşterea ca reprezentări individuale sau dependenţe simple, neglijând relaţiile structurale abundente dintre reprezentările intermediare. Pentru a depăși problemele, prezentăm un nou cadru de distilare a cunoștințelor care adună reprezentări intermediare din granulități semantice multiple (de exemplu, jetoane, intervale și eșantioane) și formează cunoștințele ca relații structurale mai sofisticate specificate ca interacțiunile pereche și unghiurile geometrice triplete bazate pe reprezentări multi-granularitate. Mai mult decât atât, propunem distilarea cunoștințelor structurale multi-granularitate bine organizate elevului ierarhic peste straturi. Rezultatele experimentale privind benchmark GLUE demonstreaza ca metoda noastra depaseste metodele avansate de distilare.', 'so': 'Si loo beddelo aqoonta tusaale yar oo loo beddelo si loo kala sooco waxay u kordhisay xiiso badan sanadkii ugu danbeeyey. Isticmaalka ka hortagga ayaa aqoonta laga soo wareejiyaa qaybaha luuqada qofka ah (tusaale ahaan heerka calaamadda ama sameynta), taas oo aan ku filnayn in loo represento taajirka semantika qoraalka iyo aqoonta muhiimka ah. Taas waxaa kale oo ay qaababkan aqoonta u sameeyaan sida qof gaar ah ama ay ku xiriiran fudud yihiin, iyagoo ka halmaanaya xiriir dhismo badan oo ka mid ah wakiilada dhexe. Si aan dhibaatooyinka uga adkayso, waxaan keenaynaa qalabka aqoonta qoraalka ah oo ka soo ururiya noocyada dhexe oo ka soo urursada noocyada kala duduwan (tusaale ahaan calaamado, cirka iyo samooyinka) aqoontana waxaan ka dhigaynaa xiriiro kale oo saafi ah oo ku qoran labada xil-xilli ah iyo sidoo kale labada jeemetric oo xilli ah oo ku qoran tiro badan. Sidoo kale waxaynu horumarinaynaa in ardayda loo kala soocaa aqoonta dhismaha kala duduwan ee la hagaajiyey meelaha sare oo dhan. Imtixaanka ku saabsan GLUE benchmarkiisa waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayagu uu ka soo baxo qalabka kala duwan.', 'sv': 'Att överföra kunskapen till en liten modell genom destillation har väckt stort intresse de senaste åren. De vanligaste metoderna överför kunskap som härrör från språkenheter med monogranularitet (t.ex. token-nivå eller sample-nivå), vilket inte är tillräckligt för att representera textens rika semantik och kan förlora viss viktig kunskap. Dessutom bildar dessa metoder kunskapen som individuella representationer eller deras enkla beroenden, och försummar rikliga strukturella relationer mellan mellanrepresentationer. För att övervinna problemen presenterar vi ett nytt kunskapsdestillationsramverk som samlar mellanliggande representationer från flera semantiska granulariteter (t.ex. tokens, spans och samples) och bildar kunskapen som mer sofistikerade strukturella relationer specificerade som parvisa interaktioner och triplet-visa geometriska vinklar baserade på multi-granularitetsrepresentationer. Dessutom föreslår vi att den välorganiserade multi-granularitet strukturella kunskapen destilleras till studenten hierarkiskt över lager. Experimentella resultat på GLUE benchmark visar att vår metod överträffar avancerade destillationsmetoder.', 'si': 'දන්නවය පුංචි මෝඩේල් එකක් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් අවුරුද්ධ අවුරුද්ධ වලින් ගොඩක් සුභාව මොනෝ-ග්\u200dරැන්ලුරියාත්මක භාෂා යුනිත් වලින් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ( ඒ වගේම, මේ විධානය ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියෙන් දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියෙන් හෝ ඔවුන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් විදියට, අ To overnade the challenges, we presents a new Known Distllation system that gathers intermediate repressions from Multisemantic Greunarites (e.g., Tokens, spans and samples) and form the Known as more sohisticated Struktural ties clarified as the pare-wise intermediation and the triplet-wise geometric angles based on Multi-Greunality repressions. තවත්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා හොඳ සංයෝජනය කරපු විශ්වාසිකයෙන් විශ්වාසිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු විදි GLUE බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරනවා අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂණ විදියට ප්\u200dරතික', 'ta': 'அறிவை ஒரு சிறிய மாதிரிக்கு மாற்றுவது பிரிவினை மூலம் சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் மிகவும் வட்டியை அதிகரித்து Prevailing methods transfer the knowledge derived from mono-granularity language units (e.g., token-level or sample-level), which is not enough to represent the rich semantics of a text and may lose some vital knowledge.  மேலும், இந்த முறைகள் அறிவை தனிப்பட்ட பிரதிநிதிகளாக அல்லது அவர்களுடைய சுலபமான சார்புகளாக வடிவமைக்கின்றன, இடையில் உள்ள நடுவில பிரச்சனைகளை வெற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் ஒரு புதிய அறிவு பிரிப்பு சட்டத்தை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அது பல பெமான்டிக் குறிப்புகளிலிருந்து நடுநிலையான பிரிவுகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் மற்றும் அறிவை மிகவும் சுக்கலான அமை மேலும், நாம் நன்றாக நிறுவப்பட்ட பல்வேறு சிறப்பு உருவமைப்பு அறிவை மாணவர்களுக்கு அடுக்குகள் மூலம் மாணவர்களுக்கு மாறு GLUE பெங்க்மார்க் மீது சோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'علم کو ایک چھوٹی موڈل کی طرف متفرق کرنے کے ذریعہ اگلے سالوں میں بہت زیادہ سود اٹھایا ہے۔ روش کے مطابق ایک گرانولیٹی زبان یونیٹوں سے علم کی ترجمہ کرنے سے روکتے ہیں (جیسے ٹوکین-سطح یا نمونہ-سطح) جو ایک متن کے ثروت سیمانٹیکوں کو نمونہ دکھانے کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے اور کچھ حیات علم ضائع ہو سکتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، یہ طریقے علم کو ایک شخص کی نمایش یا ان کی ساده اعتباری کے طور پر بناتے ہیں، اور ان کے متوسط نمایش کے درمیان بہت سی ساختار رابطے غافل کرتے ہیں. مشکلات پر غالب ہونے کے لئے، ہم ایک نئی علم جدائی فریمیٹ فریمیٹ ڈال دیتے ہیں جو تعداد سیمنٹی گرونولریٹ سے متوسط نمونات جمع کرتا ہے اور علم کو زیادہ مصنوعی ساختاری رابطہ بناتا ہے جو دو سمندر کی تعداد کے طور پر مشخص ہوتی ہے اور تین سمندر کی جسمٹریکی زاویں پر متوسط ہوتی ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے استاد کے لئے بہترین سازمان کئی زیادتیاں ساختہ علم کی تفصیل کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جو استاد کے اندر تفصیل کے طور پر ہے۔ GLUE benchmark کے تجربے کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ آگے بڑھتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Việc chuyển tri thức sang một mẫu nhỏ nhờ chưng cất đã gây chú ý nhiều trong những năm gần đây. Những phương pháp trước đây truyền đi kiến thức từ các đơn vị ngôn ngữ đơn vị hạt (v. d. vật lưu giữ hay dạng mẫu) chưa đủ để đại diện cho ngữ pháp giàu có của một văn bản và có thể mất đi một số kiến thức quan trọng. Bên cạnh đó, các phương pháp này là kiến thức về những biểu hiện cá nhân hay đơn giản quan hệ phụ thuộc của họ, bỏ qua nhiều quan hệ cấu trúc giữa các đại biểu. Để giải quyết các vấn đề, chúng tôi giới thiệu một bộ phận chưng cất kiến thức mới thu thập các biểu tượng trung cấp từ các độ hạt phân biệt đa thể (v. d. vật thể, chi tiết và mẫu) và tạo ra kiến thức như các quan hệ cấu trúc phức tạp hơn được xác định như là các tương tác hai mặt và các g óc hình học ba chiều dựa trên các biểu tượng đa hạt. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề nghị chưng cất kiến thức cấu trúc đa hạt được tổ chức theo cấp độ phân cấp của sinh viên. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên tiêu chuẩn GLUE cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được cách chưng cất tiên tiến.', 'uz': "Transferring the knowledge to a small model through distillation has raised great interest in recent years.  Name Bu usullarni oddiy tashkilotlar yoki oddiy ishlatuvchilarga ega bo'ladi, o'rtacha tashkilotlar orasiday ko'p tuzilishini o'zgartirish mumkin. Muammolarni bekor qilish uchun, biz bir necha semantik granularidan o'rtasida o'rtacha taʼminlovchi ajoyib ajoyib chiqaruvchining chegarasini ko'plab qo'yish va ko'plab granulik tashkilotlariga e g a bo'lgan narsalarni qo'shimcha sofistikal aloqalarni qo'shish va ikki xil interfeyslik va ikki xil geometrik burchaklari asosida yaratilgan. Ko'pchilik, biz o'quvchi ko'plab-granulik strukturasi haqida o'quvchiga o'qituvchilarga ajratishni talab qilamiz. Name", 'bg': 'Прехвърлянето на знанията в малък модел чрез дестилация предизвика голям интерес през последните години. Преобладаващите методи прехвърлят знанията, получени от единици на еднократна езикова единица (например ниво символ или ниво пример), което не е достатъчно, за да представи богатата семантика на текста и може да загуби някои жизненоважни знания. Освен това, тези методи формират знанието като индивидуални представяния или техните прости зависимости, пренебрегвайки изобилните структурни отношения между междинните представяния. За да преодолеем проблемите, представяме нова рамка за дестилация на знанието, която събира междинни представи от множество семантични гранулитети (например символи, интервали и образци) и формира знанията като по-сложни структурни отношения, определени като двойки взаимодействия и трикратни геометрични ъгли, базирани на мулти-гранулирани представи. Освен това предлагаме дестилиране на добре организираните многогранулирани структурни знания на студента йерархично през слоевете. Експерименталните резултати на бенчмарка показват, че нашият метод превъзхожда съвременните методи за дестилация.', 'nl': 'Het overbrengen van de kennis naar een klein model door distillatie heeft de laatste jaren grote belangstelling gewekt. Overtreffende methoden dragen de kennis die is afgeleid van mono-granularity taaleenheden (bijv. token-level of sample-level), die niet voldoende is om de rijke semantiek van een tekst weer te geven en wat essentiële kennis kan verliezen. Bovendien vormen deze methoden de kennis als individuele representaties of hun eenvoudige afhankelijkheden, waarbij overvloedige structurele relaties tussen tussenrepresentaties worden verwaarloosd. Om de problemen op te lossen, presenteren we een nieuw kennisdestillatiekraamwerk dat intermediaire representaties verzamelt van meerdere semantische granulariteiten (bijv. tokens, overspanningen en samples) en de kennis vormt als meer geavanceerde structurele relaties gespecificeerd als de paar-wise interacties en de triplet-wise geometrische hoeken gebaseerd op multi-granularity representaties. Bovendien stellen we voor om de goed georganiseerde multi-granularity structurele kennis aan de student hiërarchisch over lagen te distilleren. Experimentele resultaten op GLUE benchmark tonen aan dat onze methode beter presteert dan geavanceerde distillatiemethoden.', 'da': 'Overførsel af viden til en lille model gennem destillation har skabt stor interesse i de seneste år. Fremherskende metoder overfører den viden, der stammer fra mono-granularitetssprogenheder (f.eks. token-niveau eller sample-niveau), hvilket ikke er nok til at repræsentere den rige semantik i en tekst og kan miste en vis vigtig viden. Desuden danner disse metoder viden som individuelle repræsentationer eller deres simple afhængigheder, idet de forsømmer rigelige strukturelle relationer mellem mellemliggende repræsentationer. For at overvinde problemerne præsenterer vi en ny viden destillation ramme, der samler mellemliggende repræsentationer fra flere semantiske granulariteter (f.eks. tokens, spænder og prøver) og danner viden som mere sofistikerede strukturelle relationer specificeret som de parvise interaktioner og de triplet-vise geometriske vinkler baseret på multi-granularitet repræsentationer. Desuden foreslår vi destillering af den velorganiserede multi-granularitet strukturelle viden til eleven hierarkisk på tværs af lag. Eksperimentelle resultater på GLUE benchmark viser, at vores metode overgår avancerede destillationsmetoder.', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje znanja na mali model iz destilacije povećalo je veliki interes u posljednjih godina. Za sprječavanje metoda prebacivanja znanja iz jednostavnih jedinica za monogranularnost (npr. nivoa znakova ili nivoa uzoraka), koja nije dovoljna da predstavlja bogate semantike teksta i može izgubiti neke vitalne znanje. Osim toga, te metode formiraju znanje kao pojedinačne predstave ili njihove jednostavne zavisnosti, zaboravljajući ogromne strukturne odnose među prosječnim predstavljanjima. Za prevladanje problema, predstavljamo novi okvir destilacije znanja koji skuplja prosječne predstave iz višesemantičkih granularitija (npr. znakova, spanova i uzorka) i formira znanje kao sofisticiranije strukturne odnose određene kao interakcije na parovima i trostrukim geometrijskim uglovima temeljene na višegranularnom predstavljanju. Osim toga, predlažemo destilaciju dobro organiziranog multigranularnog strukturnog znanja učenicima hijerarhički preko slojeva. Eksperimentalni rezultati na kriteriji GLUE pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi napredne metode destilacije.', 'de': 'Die Übertragung des Wissens auf ein kleines Modell durch Destillation hat in den letzten Jahren großes Interesse geweckt. Vorherrschende Methoden übertragen das Wissen aus monogranularen Spracheinheiten (z.B. Token-Level oder Sample-Level), das nicht ausreicht, um die reiche Semantik eines Textes darzustellen und möglicherweise wichtige Kenntnisse verlieren kann. Außerdem bilden diese Methoden das Wissen als individuelle Repräsentationen oder ihre einfachen Abhängigkeiten, wobei reichlich strukturelle Beziehungen zwischen Zwischenrepräsentationen vernachlässigt werden. Um die Probleme zu überwinden, präsentieren wir ein neuartiges Wissensdestillationsframework, das Zwischenrepräsentationen aus mehreren semantischen Granularitäten (z. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir vor, das gut organisierte multigranulare Strukturwissen über Schichten hinweg hierarchisch zu destillieren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse am GLUE Benchmark zeigen, dass unsere Methode fortschrittliche Destillationsmethoden übertrifft.', 'id': 'Memindahkan pengetahuan ke model kecil melalui destilasi telah meningkatkan minat besar dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Metode pemilihan transfer pengetahuan yang berasal dari unit bahasa monogranularitas (contohnya, tingkat token atau tingkat sampel), yang tidak cukup untuk mewakili semantik kaya dari teks dan mungkin kehilangan beberapa pengetahuan penting. Selain itu, metode-metode ini membentuk pengetahuan sebagai representation individu atau dependensi sederhana mereka, mengabaikan hubungan struktur yang banyak di antara representation intermedi. Untuk mengatasi masalah-masalah, kami mempersembahkan rangkaian distilasi pengetahuan baru yang mengumpulkan representation intermedi dari berbagai granularitas semantis (contoh, token, span dan sampel) dan membentuk pengetahuan sebagai hubungan struktural yang lebih canggih yang dinyatakan sebagai interaksi pasangan-bijaksana dan sudut geometri tiga-bijaksana berdasarkan representation multi-granularitas. Selain itu, kami menyarankan mendestilkan pengetahuan struktur multi-granularitas yang terorganisasi dengan baik untuk siswa secara hierarkis melintasi lapisan. Hasil eksperimen pada benchmark GLUE menunjukkan bahwa metode kita lebih melampaui metode destilasi maju.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 증류를 통해 지식을 작은 모형으로 옮겨 큰 흥미를 끌었다.현재 유행하는 방법은 단립도 언어 단원(예를 들어 표기급이나 견본급)에서 파생된 지식을 전달하는 것이다. 이것은 텍스트의 풍부한 의미를 나타내기에는 부족하고 중요한 지식을 잃을 수 있다.그 밖에 이런 방법은 지식을 단독적인 표시나 간단한 의존 관계를 형성하고 중간 표시 간의 풍부한 구조 관계를 소홀히 한다.이러한 문제점을 극복하기 위해 우리는 새로운 지식 추출 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 여러 가지 의미의 입도(예를 들어 표기, 경계와 견본)에서 중간 표시를 수집하고 지식을 더욱 복잡한 구조 관계를 형성한다. 예를 들어 다립도 표시를 바탕으로 하는 쌍의 상호작용과 삼중 기하각이다.그 밖에 우리는 조직이 양호한 다립도 구조 지식을 층별로 나누어 학생들에게 추출할 것을 건의합니다.GLUE benchmark에서의 실험 결과는 우리의 방법이 선진적인 증류 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'تغییر علم به یک مدل کوچک از طریق تفریح علاقه\u200cای بزرگ در سالهای اخیر افزایش داده است. روش\u200cهایی که متوقف کردن علم از واحدهای زبان mono-granularity (مثل سطح نشان\u200cها یا سطح نمونه\u200cها) است، که به اندازه کافی نیست تا نشان دهد semantics ثروتمند یک متن و ممکن است بعضی از دانش\u200cهای حیاتی را از دست دهد. علاوه بر این، این روش\u200cها علم را به عنوان نماینده\u200cهای فردی یا بستگی ساده\u200cهایشان شکل می\u200cدهند، و رابطه\u200cهای ساختاری بسیار زیادی بین نماینده\u200cهای بین\u200cالمللی را فراموش می\u200cکنند. برای تغییر مشکلات، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که دانش ساختاری بسیار ساختاری بسیار ساختاری را برای دانش آموزان در طبقه\u200cهای مختلف جدا کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای روی برچسب GLUE نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما روش\u200cهای برچسب\u200cهای پیشرفته\u200cای را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Kubadilisha maarifa kwa mtindo mdogo kupitia utofauti umeibua maslahi makubwa katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Utawala wa kuzuia kuhamisha maarifa yaliyotokana na vitengo vya lugha za kigaidi (kwa mfano ngazi ya alama au ngazi ya sampuli), ambayo haitoshi kuwakilisha matajiri ya maandishi na inaweza kupoteza maarifa muhimu. Zaidi ya hayo, mbinu hizi zinatengeneza maarifa kama wakilisha watu binafsi au kutegemea wao rahisi, wakipuuza mahusiano mengi ya muundo miongoni mwa uwakilishi wa kati. To overcome the problems, we present a novel knowledge distillation framework that gathers intermediate representations from multiple semantic granularities (e.g., tokens, spans and samples) and forms the knowledge as more sophisticated structural relations specified as the pair-wise interactions and the triplet-wise geometric angles based on multi-granularity representations.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza kutofautisha maarifa ya miundombi yenye ufanisi mkubwa kwa ajili ya wanafunzi katika maeneo mengi. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye bendera ya GLUE yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inafanya njia za utofauti zilizopangwa.', 'af': "Oordra die kennis na 'n klein model deur destilasie het groot belang in onlangse jaar opgewek. Vooraf metodes oordra die kennis van mono-granulariteit taal eenhede (bv. token-vlak of voorbeeld-vlak), wat is nie genoeg om die ryke semantieke van 'n teks te verteenwoordig en dalk mag sommige vitaal kennis verloor. Buiten, hierdie metodes vorm die kennis as individuele verteenwoordigheid of hulle eenvoudige afhanklikhede en verwerp oorvloedige strukturele verwantings onder middelste verteenwoordighede. Om die probleem te oorwin, laat ons 'n nuwe kennis verskillering raamwerk voorsien wat versamel middelste voorstellings van veelvuldige semantiese granularisies (bv. tokens, spans en opvalle) en formeer die kennis as meer sofistikeerde strukturele relasies gespesifiseer as die paar-wyse interaksies en die triplet-wyse geometriese hoeke gebaseer op multigranularisiteit voorstellings. Maar ons voorstel om die goed organiseerde multigranulariteit struktureerde kennis te distiliseer aan die studente hierarkies oor laagte. Eksperimentale resultate op GLUE benchmark wys dat ons metode uitvoer gevorderde destilasie metodes.", 'tr': 'Bilimi daýratmak üçin kiçi bir nusga göçürmek soňky ýyllar içine gaty gyzyklandy. Bir mono-granularity dilinden gelen bilimi terjime etmek üçin döwletlere (meselâ, token-derejesi ýa-da örnek-derejesi), metin baý semantiklerini temel etmek üçin ýeterlik däldir we möhüm bilimi ýitirip biler. Bu yöntemler bireysel temsiller ýa-da basit bağlantılary olarak bilim şeklinde cömert edip, orta temsiller arasynda örän bir struktur ilişkilerini bozmaýarlar. Meselelerin üstüne çykmak üçin, bir täze bilim taýýarlanmasy çerçevesini g örkeýäris we bu bilimi birnäçe semantik granularitlardan (meselâ, tokens, spanler we ördinatlardan) we bilimi çift-ýigre terjimeler we üçünji gezek geometrik köşelerine daýanýar. Mundan soňra, biz okuwçylara hijerarhiýa daşky düzümlendirilen köp granularlyk bilimi taýýarlamagy teklip edip teklip edýäris. GLUE netijesinde gözlemek netijesi biziň metodamyzyň öňünden çykyş ýüze çykýandygyny görkez.', 'am': 'እውቀትን ወደ ትንሽ ምሳሌ በመለስ በቅርቢቱ ዓመታት በጣም ውስጠ አበዛ፡፡ የሚከለክል ሥርዓት ከሞንቶ-ግራnuity ቋንቋ ክፍሎች እውቀትን ይለውጣል (ምሳሌ token-level ወይም ምሳሌ-level), የጽሑፍ ባለ ጠጎች ስምታንቲክ መቆጣጠር አይበቃም እና ምንም አዋቂ እውቀት ሊጠፋ ይችላል። ከዚህም በቀር፣ እነዚህ ሥርዓቶች እውቀቱን የግዛት ብሔራዊ መልዕክቶች ወይም ቀላል ጥያቄዎች እንዲሆኑ ያሳስታሉ፤ በመካከለኛውም መልዕክቶች መካከል ብዙ የሠርካዊ ግንኙነት ሲሳወቁ፡፡ ጉዳዮቹን ለማሸንፍ፣ እና በሁለት ጥበበኛ ተግባር እና በብዛት ግንኙነት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የዩንቨርስቲካዊ ግንኙነትን (ለምሳሌ ምልክቶች፣ ስፋቶች እና ምሳሌዎች) የሚሰበስብ የመካከለኛውን የአውቀት መለወጫ ፍሬም እና በብዛት ግንኙነት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት እና ሦስት-wise የጂዮሜትሪክ ክፍሎች የሚያደርግ እና እውቀትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተመሳሳይ፣ የተሰናዱትን ብዙዎች አካባቢነት እውቀትን ለተማሪዎቹ በተለይ ደረጃዎች ላይ በመለወጥ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Experimental results on GLUE benchmark demonstrate that our method outperforms advanced distillation methods.', 'az': 'Elmi küçük bir modellə istifadə etmək son illərdə çox maraq artırdı. Mö-granularity dil birliklərindən g ələn elmi (məsələn, token-seviyyəti və nümunə-seviyyəti) təkrar etmək üçün təkrar edilən metodları təkrar etmək və bəzi mövcud elmi itirmək üçün kifayət deyildir. Bu metodlar həmçinin individu göstəricilər və ya onların basit bağlılıqları kimi bilgi yaradılır, orta göstəricilər arasında çoxlu strukturlu ilişkileri unutdurlar. Bütün problemlərdən üstün g əlmək üçün yeni bir elm destilasyonu framework ünü göstəririk ki, çoxlu semantik granularitilərdən orta ifadələri toplayır (bəzisi, möcüzələr, spans və nümunələrdən) və biliyi çoxlu granularitə dayanan iki tərəfdən və üçüncü geometrik küngüllərdən daha sofistikli strukturlu ilişkiler kimi formayır. Daha sonra, öğrencilərə hiyerarşik olaraq müxtəlif çoxlu granularlıq strukturlu bilgiləri təşkil edirik. GLUE benchmark təcrübəsində təcrübə sonuçları təcrübə edir ki, metodumuzun avans destilasyon metodlarını aşkar edir.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরের মধ্যে জ্ঞান বিচ্ছিন্ন করার মাধ্যমে একটি ছোট মডেলে জ্ঞান পরিবর্তন করা হয়েছে। প্রতিরোধী পদ্ধতি মোনো গ্রান্নলিটি ভাষা ইউনিট থেকে যে জ্ঞান পাওয়া গেছে তা পরিবর্তন করা যায় (উদাহরণস্বরূপ টোক্সলেন্ড অথবা নম্বর স্তর), যা একটি টেক্সটের সমৃদ এছাড়াও এই পদ্ধতি ব্যক্তিগত প্রতিনিধিত্ব অথবা তাদের সাধারণ নির্ভর হিসেবে জ্ঞান গঠন করে, মধ্যপ্রতিনিধিদের মধ্যে বেশী কাঠ সমস্যাকে জয়ী করার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের জ্ঞান বিচ্ছিন্ন কার্যক্রম উপস্থাপন করি যা বিভিন্ন সেমেন্টিক গ্রানালিটির (যেমন চিহ্ন, স্পেন এবং নমুনা) থেকে মধ্যপ্রতিনিধিত্ব সংগ্রহ করে এবং জ্ঞানের সৃষ্টি করে য এছাড়াও আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে ভাল সংগঠিত বহুসংগঠনের কাঠামোর জ্ঞান বিচ্ছিন্ন করা হয়েছে তার ছাত্রছাত্রীদের হিয়ার জিলিউই বেনম্যার্কের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি উন্নত বিচ্ছিন্ন পদ্ধতিতে প্রয়োজন।', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje znanja na mali model iz destilacije povećalo je veliki interes u posljednjih godina. Za sprječavanje metoda prebacivanja znanja iz jedinica za monogranularnost (npr. nivo znakova ili nivo uzoraka), koja nije dovoljna da predstavlja bogate semantike teksta i može izgubiti neke vitalne znanje. Osim toga, te metode formiraju znanje kao pojedinačne predstave ili njihove jednostavne zavisnosti, zaboravljajući ogromne strukturne odnose među prosječnim predstavljanjima. Za prevladanje problema, predstavljamo novi okvir destilacije znanja koji skuplja prosječne predstave od višesemantičkih granularitija (npr. znakova, spanova i uzorka) i formira znanje kao sofisticiranije strukturne odnose određene kao interakcije na parovima i trostrukim geometrijskim uglovima bazirane na višegranularnim predstavljanjima. Osim toga, predlažemo destilaciju dobro organiziranog multigranularnog strukturnog znanja učenicima hijerarhički preko slojeva. Eksperimentalni rezultati na kriteriji GLUE pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi napredne metode destilacije.', 'ca': "Transfer el coneixement a un petit model a través de la destilació ha suscitat un gran interès en els últims anys. Els mètodes preferits transfereixen el coneixement derivat d'unitats de llenguatge monogranularitat (per exemple, nivell de fitxes o nivell de mostra), que no és suficient per representar la senàntica rica d'un text i pot perdre algun coneixement vital. A més, aquests mètodes formen el coneixement com a representacions individuals o les seves simples dependencies, ignorant les relacions estructurals abundants entre representacions intermedies. Per superar els problemes, presentem un nou marc de destilació del coneixement que recolliu representacions intermedies de granularitats semàntiques múltiples (per exemple fitxes, amples i mostres) i formen el coneixement com relacions estructurals més sofisticades especificades com les interaccions entre parelles i els angles geomètrics en triples basats en representacions de multigranularitat. A més, proposem distilar el coneixement estructural de multigranularitat ben organitzat a l'estudiant jeràrquicament a través de capes. Els resultats experimentals de la comparació GLUE demostren que el nostre mètode supera mètodes avançats de destilació.", 'cs': 'Přenos znalostí do malého modelu destilací vzbudil v posledních letech velký zájem. Převažující metody přenášejí znalosti odvozené z monogranularitních jazykových jednotek (např. úrovně tokenů nebo vzorků), které nestačí k reprezentaci bohaté sémantiky textu a mohou ztratit některé důležité znalosti. Kromě toho tyto metody tvoří znalosti jako jednotlivé reprezentace nebo jejich jednoduché závislosti, zanedbávající bohaté strukturální vztahy mezi mezireprezentacemi. Pro překonání těchto problémů představujeme nový rámec destilace znalostí, který shromažďuje meziproduktivní reprezentace z více sémantických granularit (např. tokeny, rozpětí a vzorky) a tvoří znalosti jako sofistikovanější strukturální vztahy specifikované jako párové interakce a trojčatové geometrické úhly založené na multigranularitních reprezentacích. Navíc navrhujeme destilovat dobře organizované strukturální znalosti multigranularity studentovi hierarchicky napříč vrstvami. Experimentální výsledky na GLUE benchmarku ukazují, že naše metoda překonává pokročilé destilační metody.', 'et': 'Teadmiste edasiandmine väikesesse mudelisse destilleerimise kaudu on viimastel aastatel tekitanud suurt huvi. Valitsevad meetodid edastavad teadmisi, mis on saadud monogranulaarsuse keeleüksustest (nt märgitasemel või näidistasemel), millest ei piisa teksti rikkaliku semantika esindamiseks ja võivad kaotada mõned elulised teadmised. Lisaks moodustavad need meetodid teadmised individuaalsete representatsioonidena või nende lihtsate sõltuvustena, jättes tähelepanuta rikkalikke struktuurseid suhteid vahepealsete representatsioonide vahel. Probleemide lahendamiseks esitame uudse teadmiste destilleerimise raamistiku, mis kogub vahepealseid esitusi mitmest semantilisest granulaarsusest (nt märgid, võimendid ja näidised) ning moodustab teadmised keerukamate struktuuriliste suhetena, mis on määratletud paari-mõistlikud interaktsioonid ja kolmekümne-mõõtmelised geomeetrilised nurgad, mis põhinevad mitme granulaarsuse esitustel. Lisaks teeme ettepaneku destilleerida hästi organiseeritud mitme granulaarsusega struktuursed teadmised üliõpilasele hierarhiliselt kihtide vahel. GLUE võrdlusaluse katsetulemused näitavad, et meie meetod ületab täiustatud destilleerimismeetodeid.', 'fi': 'Tietojen siirtäminen pieneen malliin tislaamalla on herättänyt suurta kiinnostusta viime vuosina. Hallitsevat menetelmät siirtävät monogranulaarisista kieliyksiköistä johdettua tietoa (esim. token-taso tai näytetaso), mikä ei riitä kuvaamaan tekstin runsasta semantiikkaa ja voi menettää elintärkeää tietoa. Lisäksi nämä menetelmät muodostavat tiedon yksittäisinä representaatioina tai niiden yksinkertaisina riippuvuuksina jättäen huomiotta runsaat rakenteelliset suhteet välirepresentaatioiden välillä. Ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi esittelemme uuden tiedon tislauskehyksen, joka kokoaa välimerkkejä useista semanttisista granularidioista (esim. tokeneista, väleistä ja näytteistä) ja muodostaa tiedon kehittyneempinä rakenteellisina suhteina, jotka määritellään pariviisaiksi vuorovaikutuksiksi ja kolmiosaisiksi geometrisiksi kulmiksi, jotka perustuvat monirakeisuusesityksiin. Lisäksi ehdotamme, että hyvin organisoitu monirakeinen rakennetieto tislataan opiskelijalle hierarkkisesti kerrosten yli. GLUE-benchmarkin kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme on kehittynyttä tislausmenetelmää parempi.', 'sq': "Transferimi i njohurive në një model të vogël nëpërmjet distillacionit ka ngritur interes të madh në vitet e fundit. Prevailing methods transfer the knowledge derived from mono-granularity language units (e.g., token-level or sample-level), which is not enough to represent the rich semantics of a text and may lose some vital knowledge.  Përveç kësaj, këto metoda formojnë njohurinë si përfaqësime individuale apo varësitë e tyre të thjeshta, duke harruar marrëdhëniet strukturore të mjaftueshme midis përfaqësimeve të mesme. Për t'i kapërcyer problemet, ne paraqesim një kuadër të ri të distillacionit të njohurive që mbledh përfaqësime të ndërmjetësuara nga granularitete të shumta semantike (për shembull, shenjat, zgjatjet dhe mostrat) dhe formon njohurinë si marrëdhënie më të sofistikuara strukturore të specifikuara si ndërveprimet në mënyrë të palëvizshme dhe këndvështrimet në mënyrë të tre-palëvizshme gjeometrike bazuar në përfaq Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë distilimin e njohurive strukturore të shumëgranularitetit të organizuar mirë për student ët në mënyrë hierarkike nëpër shtresa. Rezultatet eksperimentale në standartin GLUE demonstrojnë se metoda jonë ekziston më shumë se metodat e avancuara të distillacionit.", 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում գիտելիքների փոխանցումը դեսլիլացիայի միջոցով փոքր մոդելի է մեծ հետաքրքրություն դարձրել: Prevailing methods transfer the knowledge derived from mono-granularity language units (e.g., token-level or sample-level), which is not enough to represent the rich semantics of a text and may lose some vital knowledge.  Ավելին, այս մեթոդները ձևավորում են գիտելիքը որպես անհատական ներկայացումներ կամ նրանց պարզ կախվածություններ, անտեսելով բավականին կառուցվածքային հարաբերությունները միջին ներկայացումների միջև: Խնդիրներին հաղթահարելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր գիտելիքների դիսլիլացիայի շրջանակ, որը հավաքում է միջին ներկայացումներ բազմաթիվ սեմանտիկ գրանոլարիաներից (օրինակ նշաններ, տարածքներ և նմուշներ) և ձևավորում է գիտելիքը որպես ավելի բարդ կառուցվածքային հարաբերություններ, որոնք նշանակում են զույգչափ հարաբերություններ և երեք Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք, որ լավ կազմակերպված բազմագծային կառուցվածքային գիտելիքները տարբեր շերտերում դիստելը աշակերտներին: Experimental results on GLUE benchmark demonstrate that our method outperforms advanced distillation methods.', 'jv': 'Ndoleh kuwi kesempatan kanggo model sing apik, dadi entuk sing nduwé banjur sing apik. text-tool-action politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness iso nggawe perbudhakan kelas kuwi nggawe kesempakan sistem sing beraksi perbudhakan kelas karo hal-hal sing nggawe ngupakan kelas semanti granularity politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive"), politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngucap Ciro', 'he': 'העברת הידע למודל קטן באמצעות הדיסטילה העלה עניין גדול בשנים האחרונות. שיטות מוקדמות מעבירות את הידע שנוצר מאיחידות שפת מונוגרניליות (למשל רמת סימנים או רמת דגימות), שזה לא מספיק כדי לייצג את הסמנטיקה העשירה של טקסט ויכול לאבד מידע חיוני. חוץ מזה, השיטות האלה נוצרות את הידע כמייצגים בודדים או התלויות הפשוטות שלהם, שוכחים מערכות יחסים מבנייים רבים בין מייצגים ביניים. כדי להתגבר על הבעיות, אנו מציגים מסגרת מיתוח ידע חדשה שמאספת מייצגים ביניים ממספר גרנולריות סמנטיות (למשל סימנים, רחבות ודגימות) ויוצרים את הידע כיחסים מבניינים מתוחכמים יותר שנמצאים בתור אינטראקציות בין זוגות ובין זוגות, והזוויות הגאומטריות השלישיות מבוססות על מייצגים רבים גרנולריות. חוץ מזה, אנו מציעים למחוק את הידררכית הידררכית הידררכית של הידע המבני המולאורגני המאורגן היטב. תוצאות ניסיוניות על נקודת רמז GLUE מראות ששיטתנו עולה על שיטות משקה מתקדמות.', 'sk': 'Prenos znanja v majhen model z destilacijo je v zadnjih letih vzbudil veliko zanimanje. Prevladujoče metode prenašajo znanje, pridobljeno iz enotnih jezikovnih enot (npr. stopnja žetona ali stopnja vzorca), kar ni dovolj za predstavljanje bogate semantike besedila in lahko izgubi nekaj bistvenega znanja. Poleg tega te metode tvorijo znanje kot posamezne reprezentacije ali njihove preproste odvisnosti, pri čemer zanemarjajo obilne strukturne odnose med vmesnimi reprezentacijami. Za premagovanje problemov predstavljamo nov okvir destilacije znanja, ki zbira vmesne reprezentacije iz več semantičnih granulativnosti (npr. žetonov, razponov in vzorcev) in oblikuje znanje kot bolj prefinjena strukturna relacija, ki so določena kot interakcije v dveh in geometrijski koti trojčkov, ki temeljijo na večgranulativnih reprezentacijah. Poleg tega predlagamo, da se študentu hierarhično preko plasti destila dobro organizirano večgranularnostno strukturno znanje. Eksperimentalni rezultati na referenčni vrednosti GLUE kažejo, da naša metoda presega napredne metode destilacije.', 'ha': "Transferring the knowledge to a small model through distillation has raised great interest in recent years.  @ info: whatsthis Babu, waɗannan hanyõyin su zaɓi saninta kamar misãlai guda ko kuma masu sauki, kuma sunã saɓa da haɗuwa masu yawa na huɗu a tsakanin mataimaka. To domin ta rinjãye masu fitina, za mu zo da firam masu saniya na yanzu wanda ke tãra masu tsakanin daga multi-granulariti (misali, alama, spanni da misãlai) kuma ke danna ilmi kamar da mafi sofi masu haɗi na matsayi wanda aka ƙayyade su kamar interaction biyu-hikima da sau-sau-biyu geometric kallon geometric, a kan karatun masu multi-granularity. Kayya, Munã goyya da in rarraba sanar da multi-granularty masu da aka organize shi, a kan karatun na sarrafiya. Matarin jarrabãwa na GLUU ya nuna cewa hanyoyinmu za'a samar da shiryoyin shari-shari.", 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིག་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཆུང་ཞིག་གི་སྐུར་སྐྱེལ་བཞིན་པའི་ལོ་ངོ་ལ་དུས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེ ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐོར་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འདྲེན་བྱེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། དཔེར་ན། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་དེ་ནི་སྒེར་སྡུད་པ་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མཐུན་དང་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པའི་དབྱིན་གྱི་འབྲེལ་བ To overcome the problems, we present a novel knowledge distillation framework that gathers intermediate representations from multiple semantic granularities (e.g., tokens, spans and samples) and forms the knowledge as more sophisticated structural relations specified as the pair-wise interactions and the triplet-wise geometric angles based on multi-granularity representations. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སློབ་ཆེན་པོ་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་སྒྲིག་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་ཆ་རྣམས་ལ་གཏོང་བཤད་རྒྱུ་དང་། GLUE འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་འགོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཀྲམ་'}
{'en': 'Rare and Zero-shot Word Sense Disambiguation using ', 'ar': 'التصحيح التلقائي: إزالة تحيز نماذج اللغة المقنعة باستخدام موجهات منحازة آليًا', 'fr': 'Auto-Debias\xa0: débiaiser les modèles de langage masqués avec des invites biaisées automatisées', 'es': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing de modelos de lenguaje enmascarado con indicaciones sesgadas automatizadas', 'pt': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models com Automated Biased Prompts', 'ja': 'Auto - Debias ：自動偏向プロンプトを使用したマスク付き言語モデルの偏見除去', 'zh': '自去偏:用偏置提示蒙版言语偏倚', 'ru': 'Auto-Debias: удаление маскированных языковых моделей с помощью автоматических предвзятых подсказок', 'hi': 'ऑटो-डेबियास: स्वचालित पक्षपाती संकेतों के साथ नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडल Debiasing', 'ga': 'Auto-Debias: Múnlaí Teanga Measctha a Dhiúltú le Leideanna Uathoibrithe Laofa', 'ka': 'ავტო- Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'hu': 'Automatikus debiák: Maszkos nyelvi modellek hibáztatása automatizált félreállításokkal', 'el': 'Αυτόματες αποσβέσεις: Αποκάλυψη προσωποποιημένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων με αυτοματοποιημένες προκατειλημμένες προτάσεις', 'it': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing dei modelli di linguaggio mascherato con Prompt biased automatizzati', 'kk': 'Авто- Debias: Debiasing қалқалаған тіл үлгілері автоматты түрлендірілген сұраулармен', 'lt': 'Auto- Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'mk': 'Автоматски дебиас: Дебизирање на маскирани јазични модели со автоматски предизвици', 'mt': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'mn': 'Авто-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'ms': 'Auto-Debias: Memdebiasing Model Bahasa Tertopeng dengan Prompt Biased Automatik', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ഡെബിയസ്: സ്വയമായി മാറ്റിയ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുമായി ഡെബിയസ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'no': 'Automatisk Debias: Debiasing maskerte språk- modeller med automatiske forsøk', 'pl': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasowanie maskowanych modeli językowych za pomocą zautomatyzowanych uprzedzonych pytań', 'sr': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'ro': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing modele de limbaj mascat cu prompte automate Biased', 'sv': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing maskerade språkmodeller med automatiska biased prompts', 'so': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automaticed Biased Prompts', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය- ඩෙබියාස්: ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி- டெபியாஸ்: தானியங்கியாக பைச் செய்யப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகளுடன் தானியங்கிய விளைவுகள்', 'ur': 'Auto Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'uz': 'Avto- DebiasName', 'vi': 'Giải thích tự động: thao tác văn bản mặt nạ với các lời hứa tự động', 'bg': 'Автоматични дебии: дебиазиране на маскирани езикови модели с автоматизирани наклонени комбинации', 'hr': 'Auto Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'da': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing maskerede sprogmodeller med automatiserede biased prompts', 'nl': 'Auto-Debias: het debiasen van gemaskerde taalmodellen met geautomatiseerde vooroordeelde prompts', 'de': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing maskierter Sprachmodelle mit automatisierten Biased Prompts', 'id': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'ko': '자동 Debias: 자동 편파 프롬프트를 사용하여 차폐 언어 모델에 Debiasing', 'fa': 'دبی\u200cساز خودکار: مدل\u200cهای زبان ماسک\u200cشده\u200cی Debiasing Debiasing with Automated Biased Prompts', 'sw': 'Kujitegemea: Mradi wa Lugha Zinazozungumzwa na Tamko zilizotokana', 'sq': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'af': 'Outo- Debias: Debiasing Masked Taal Models met Automaties Biased Promptes', 'tr': 'Otomatik Debias: Debiasing Maskeli Diller', 'am': 'dockable-action', 'hy': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'az': 'Avtomatik', 'bn': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'bs': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'cs': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing maskovaných jazykových modelů s automatizovanými zaujatými výzvami', 'et': 'Automaatsed arutelud: maskeeritud keelemudelite diskussioon automatiseeritud kallakute küsimustega', 'fi': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automatised Biased Prompts', 'ca': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts', 'jv': 'Debia-Debia: Debia-Masked Language model karo Automated Biasd Propts', 'sk': 'Auto-Debias: Debiasing maskirani jezikovni modeli z avtomatiziranimi pristranskimi pozivi', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'דיביאס אוטומטיים: דוגמני שפת מסומקות מתייחסים עם נקודות אוטומטיות', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་Debias：Debiasing Masked Language Models with Automated Biased Prompts'}
{'en': 'Word sense disambiguation (WSD) is a crucial problem in the natural language processing (NLP) community. Current methods achieve decent performance by utilizing supervised learning and large pre-trained language models. However, the imbalanced training dataset leads to poor performance on rare senses and zero-shot senses. There are more training instances and senses for words with top frequency ranks than those with low frequency ranks in the training dataset. We investigate the statistical relation between word frequency rank and word sense number distribution. Based on the relation, we propose a Z-reweighting method on the word level to adjust the training on the imbalanced dataset. The experiments show that the Z-reweighting strategy achieves performance gain on the standard English all words WSD benchmark. Moreover, the strategy can help models generalize better on rare and zero-shot senses.', 'ar': 'توجد تحيزات شبيهة بالبشر والصور النمطية الاجتماعية غير المرغوب فيها في نماذج اللغة الكبيرة المدربة مسبقًا. نظرًا للاعتماد الواسع لهذه النماذج في تطبيقات العالم الحقيقي ، فقد أصبح التخفيف من مثل هذه التحيزات مهمة ناشئة وهامة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة تلقائية للتخفيف من التحيزات في نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا. يختلف عن أعمال إزالة الحواف السابقة التي تستخدم مجموعات خارجية لضبط النماذج سابقة التدريب ، وبدلاً من ذلك نقوم بالتحقيق المباشر في التحيزات المشفرة في النماذج المحددة مسبقًا من خلال المطالبات. على وجه التحديد ، نقترح نوعًا مختلفًا من طريقة البحث بالحزمة للبحث تلقائيًا عن \\ textit {موجهات متحيزة} بحيث تكون عمليات إكمال نمط cloze هي الأكثر اختلافًا فيما يتعلق بالمجموعات السكانية المختلفة. بالنظر إلى المطالبات المتحيزة المحددة ، نقترح بعد ذلك خسارة محاذاة التوزيع للتخفيف من التحيزات. تُظهر نتائج التجارب على مجموعات البيانات والمقاييس القياسية أن نهجنا المقترح \\ textbf {Auto-Debias} يمكن أن يقلل بشكل كبير من التحيزات ، بما في ذلك التحيز الجنساني والعرقي ، في نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا مثل BERT و RoBERTa و ALBERT. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن التحسن في الإنصاف لا يقلل من قدرات فهم النماذج اللغوية ، كما هو موضح باستخدام معيار GLUE.', 'pt': 'Preconceitos humanos e estereótipos sociais indesejados existem em grandes modelos de linguagem pré-treinados. Dada a ampla adoção desses modelos em aplicações do mundo real, mitigar tais vieses tornou-se uma tarefa emergente e importante. Neste artigo, propomos um método automático para mitigar os vieses em modelos de linguagem pré-treinados. Diferente do trabalho anterior de despolarização que usa corpora externos para ajustar os modelos pré-treinados, em vez disso, sondamos diretamente os preconceitos codificados em modelos pré-treinados por meio de prompts. Especificamente, propomos uma variante do método de busca de feixe para procurar automaticamente por \\textit{prompts tendenciosos} de forma que as conclusões de estilo cloze sejam as mais diferentes em relação aos diferentes grupos demográficos. Dados os prompts tendenciosos identificados, propomos então uma perda de alinhamento de distribuição para mitigar os vieses. Os resultados de experimentos em conjuntos de dados e métricas padrão mostram que nossa abordagem \\textbf{Auto-Debias} proposta pode reduzir significativamente preconceitos, incluindo preconceito de gênero e raça, em modelos de linguagem pré-treinados, como BERT, RoBERTa e ALBERT. Além disso, a melhoria na imparcialidade não diminui a capacidade de compreensão dos modelos de linguagem, como mostrado usando o benchmark GLUE.', 'es': 'Los prejuicios de tipo humano y los estereotipos sociales no deseados existen en los grandes modelos lingüísticos preentrenados. Dada la amplia adopción de estos modelos en aplicaciones del mundo real, mitigar estos sesgos se ha convertido en una tarea emergente e importante. En este artículo, proponemos un método automático para mitigar los sesgos en los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados. A diferencia del trabajo de debiasing anterior que utiliza cuerpos externos para ajustar los modelos previamente entrenados, en su lugar investigamos directamente los sesgos codificados en los modelos preentrenados a través de indicaciones. Específicamente, proponemos una variante del método de búsqueda de haz para buscar automáticamente\\ textit {indicaciones sesgadas} de manera que las terminaciones estilo cloze sean las más diferentes con respecto a los diferentes grupos demográficos. Dadas las indicaciones sesgadas identificadas, proponemos una pérdida de alineación de distribución para mitigar los sesgos. Los resultados de experimentos en conjuntos de datos y métricas estándar muestran que nuestro enfoque propuesto de\\ textbf {Auto-Debias} puede reducir significativamente los sesgos, incluidos los prejuicios de género y raza, en modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados como BERT, ROBerta y ALBERT. Además, la mejora de la equidad no disminuye la capacidad de comprensión de los modelos lingüísticos, como se demuestra con el análisis de referencia GLUE.', 'fr': "Des préjugés de type humain et des stéréotypes sociaux indésirables existent dans les grands modèles linguistiques préformés. Compte tenu de l'adoption généralisée de ces modèles dans les applications du monde réel, l'atténuation de ces biais est devenue une tâche émergente et importante. Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthode automatique pour atténuer les biais dans les modèles linguistiques préentraînés. Contrairement aux précédents travaux de débiaisage qui utilisent des corpus externes pour affiner les modèles préentraînés, nous sondons directement les biais codés dans les modèles préentraînés via des invites. Plus précisément, nous proposons une variante de la méthode de recherche par faisceau pour rechercher automatiquement\xa0\\ textit {invites biaisées} de telle sorte que les complétions de style rapproché soient les plus différentes en fonction des différents groupes démographiques. Compte tenu des invites biaisées identifiées, nous proposons ensuite une perte d'alignement de distribution pour atténuer les biais. Les résultats d'expériences sur des ensembles de données et des métriques standard montrent que notre approche\xa0\\ textbf {Auto-Debias} proposée peut réduire de manière significative les biais, y compris les préjugés sexistes et raciaux, dans les modèles de langage préformés tels que BERT, Roberta et ALBERT. De plus, l'amélioration de l'équité ne diminue pas les capacités de compréhension des modèles linguistiques, comme le montre le benchmark GLUE.", 'ja': '人間のような偏見と望ましくない社会的ステレオタイプは、大規模な事前訓練された言語モデルに存在する。 現実のアプリケーションでこれらのモデルが広く採用されていることを考えると、そのようなバイアスを軽減することは新たに重要な課題となっています。 本稿では、事前に訓練された言語モデルにおけるバイアスを軽減するための自動方法を提案する。 外部コーポラを使用して事前に訓練されたモデルを微調整する以前のデビアリング作業とは異なり、プロンプトを介して事前に訓練されたモデルにエンコードされたバイアスを直接プローブします。 具体的には、\\ textit {偏ったプロンプト}を自動的に検索するためのビーム検索方法の変形例を提案し、その結果、クローズスタイルの完了は、異なる人口統計グループに関して最も異なる。 特定されたバイアスのあるプロンプトを考慮して、バイアスを軽減するために分配アライメント損失を提案します。 標準的なデータセットと指標に関する実験結果は、BERT、RoBERTa、ALBERTなどの事前に訓練された言語モデルで、\\ textbf {Auto - Debias}アプローチが性別や人種的な偏見を含む偏見を大幅に減らすことができることを示しています。 さらに、公平性の向上は、接着剤ベンチマークを使用して示されるように、言語モデルの理解能力を低下させることはありません。', 'zh': '类人之偏见与不欲之世刻板印象在大预训习言语模样中。 鉴其博用,损其偏见为一新之要。 本文中,我们发出一种自己的方法来轻预训练言语模样中的偏差。 与前用外语料库微调预练模者偏倚不同,吾等以径探预练模形之编码差。 具体来说曰:波束索之变体,以自索\\textit{biased prompts},使cloze风之成,计群体为最。 给定已识之偏倚,然后言布列对齐损以损偏差。 凡标准数据集、指标之实验结果表明,臣等言\\textbf{Auto-Debias}法可见减BERT,RoBERTa与ALBERT等预训言语模样之偏见,兼性别种类偏见。 此外,公平性高不减言语模样之理解能力,如用 GLUE 准试所示。', 'ru': 'Человекоподобные предрассудки и нежелательные социальные стереотипы существуют в крупных предварительно подготовленных языковых моделях. Учитывая широкое распространение этих моделей в реальных приложениях, смягчение таких предубеждений стало новой и важной задачей. В этой статье мы предлагаем автоматический метод для смягчения предвзятости в предварительно подготовленных языковых моделях. В отличие от предыдущей работы по дебированию, которая использует внешние корпуса для тонкой настройки предварительно подготовленных моделей, мы вместо этого напрямую исследуем ошибки, закодированные в предварительно подготовленных моделях, с помощью подсказок. В частности, мы предлагаем вариант метода поиска луча для автоматического поиска\\textit{смещенных подсказок} таким образом, чтобы завершения в стиле закрытия были наиболее различными по отношению к различным демографическим группам. Учитывая выявленные  предвзятые подсказки, мы затем предлагаем потерю выравнивания распределения, чтобы смягчить смещения. Результаты экспериментов со стандартными наборами данных и метриками показывают, что предлагаемый нами подход\\textbf{Авто-Дебиас} может значительно снизить предвзятость, включая гендерную и расовую предвзятость, в предварительно подготовленных языковых моделях, таких как BERT, RoBERTa и ALBERT. Более того, улучшение справедливости не снижает способности языковых моделей понимать, как показано с использованием контрольного КЛЕЯ.', 'hi': 'मानव जैसे पूर्वाग्रह और अवांछित सामाजिक रूढ़िवादी बड़े पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल में मौजूद हैं। वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों में इन मॉडलों को व्यापक रूप से अपनाने को देखते हुए, इस तरह के पूर्वाग्रहों को कम करना एक उभरता हुआ और महत्वपूर्ण कार्य बन गया है। इस पेपर में, हम पूर्वप्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल में पूर्वाग्रहों को कम करने के लिए एक स्वचालित विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पिछले debiasing काम है कि बाहरी corpora का उपयोग करता है से अलग करने के लिए ठीक धुन pretrained मॉडल, हम इसके बजाय सीधे संकेतों के माध्यम से pretrained मॉडल में एन्कोडेड पूर्वाग्रहों की जांच. विशेष रूप से, हम स्वचालित रूप से \\textit{biased prompts} के लिए खोज करने के लिए बीम खोज विधि के एक संस्करण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जैसे कि क्लोज़-स्टाइल पूर्णताएं विभिन्न जनसांख्यिकीय समूहों के संबंध में सबसे अलग हैं। पहचाने गए पक्षपाती संकेतों को देखते हुए, हम फिर पूर्वाग्रहों को कम करने के लिए एक वितरण संरेखण हानि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। मानक डेटासेट और मैट्रिक्स पर प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारे प्रस्तावित \\textbf{Auto-Debias} दृष्टिकोण BERT, RoBERTa और ALBERT जैसे पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल में लिंग और नस्लीय पूर्वाग्रह सहित पूर्वाग्रहों को काफी कम कर सकते हैं। इसके अलावा, निष्पक्षता में सुधार भाषा मॉडल की समझ क्षमताओं को कम नहीं करता है, जैसा कि GLUE बेंचमार्क का उपयोग करके दिखाया गया है।', 'ga': 'Tá laofachtaí ar nós an duine agus steiréitíopaí sóisialta neamh-inmhianaithe i múnlaí móra teanga réamhoilte. Ós rud é go nglactar go forleathan leis na samhlacha seo i bhfeidhmchláir fhíorshaolacha, tá sé ag teacht chun cinn agus ina thasc tábhachtach chun laofachtaí den sórt sin a mhaolú. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh uathoibríoch chun na laofachtaí i múnlaí teanga réamhoilte a mhaolú. Éagsúil le hobair debiasing roimhe seo a úsáideann corpora seachtracha chun mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar na samhlacha réamhoilte, déanaimid iniúchadh díreach ar na laofachtaí atá ionchódaithe i múnlaí réamhoilte trí leideanna. Go sonrach, molaimid malairt modh cuardaigh an léis chun cuardach a dhéanamh go huathoibríoch do \\textit{leideanna claonta} ionas gurb iad na comhlánuithe i stíl cloze na cinn is difriúla maidir le grúpaí déimeagrafacha éagsúla. I bhfianaise na leideanna claonta sainaitheanta, molaimid ansin caillteanas ailíniú dáilte chun na laofachtaí a mhaolú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh ar thacair shonraí chaighdeánacha agus ar mhéadracht gur féidir lenár gcur chuige \\textbf{Auto-Debias} laofachtaí a laghdú go suntasach, lena n-áirítear inscne agus claonadh ciníoch, i múnlaí teanga réamhoilte mar BERT, RoBERTa agus ALBERT. Ina theannta sin, ní laghdaítear cumas tuisceana na múnlaí teanga de bharr feabhsú na cothroime, mar a léirítear ag baint úsáide as an tagarmharc GLUE.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის მსგავსი წარმოდგენები და უცნობილი სოციალური სტერეოტიპები არსებობენ დიდი წარმოდგენების მოდელში. ამ მოდელების უფრო გავაკეთოთ რეალური მსოფლიო პროგრამებში, ასეთი წარმოდგენების შემცირება შეიძლება გახდება და მნიშვნელოვანი დავაკეთება. ჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში ავტომატური მედიოდის მინდომარება, რომელიც წარმოადგენა ენის მოდელში. განსხვავებულია წინა დებიზაციის სამუშაო, რომელიც გამოყენებს გარეშე კორპორაზე, რომელიც გამოყენებს სამუშაო მოდელების შესაძლებლობად, ჩვენ შემდეგ პირექტურად პრობიზაცია,  განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ მინდომებით საძიებო გარიანტი, რომელიც საძიებო\\ textit{ biased prompts} სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა სტილის დასრულება. განსაზღვრებულებული, ძალიან წარმოდგენების შესახებ, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებული წარმოდგენების დასრულება, რომ გადასრულებული წარმოდგენების გადასრულება. სტანდარტული მონაცემების და მეტრიკის გამოცდილების შედეგია, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემებული მონაცემები \\textbf{Auto-Debias} მონაცემები შეუძლია მნიშვნელოვანად გადასრულებული წინასწორებების შესახებ, როგორც გენდერი და პაციალური დამატებით, სწორედ სწორედ განვითარება ენის მოდელების შესაძლებლობას არ შემცირებს, როგორც გამოყენებული GLUE ბანქმერის გამოყენებაში.', 'hu': 'Emberszerű előítéletek és nem kívánt társadalmi sztereotípiák léteznek a nagy, előkészített nyelvi modellekben. Mivel ezeket a modelleket a valós alkalmazásokban széles körben alkalmazzák, az ilyen előítéletek enyhítése fontos feladattá vált. Ebben a tanulmányban egy automatikus módszert javasolunk az előkészített nyelvi modellek elfogultságainak enyhítésére. A korábbi debiasing munkától eltérően, amely külső corporákat használ az előkészített modellek finomhangolására, ehelyett közvetlenül vizsgáljuk az előkészített modellekben kódolt előírásokat. Konkrétan a beam keresési módszer egy változatát javasoljuk, amelynek segítségével automatikusan kereshető \\textit{elfogult prompts} úgy, hogy a cloze-stílusú kiegészítések a különböző demográfiai csoportok tekintetében a legkülönbözőbbek legyenek. Az azonosított elfogult kérdésekre tekintettel ezután javasoljuk az elosztási igazítás veszteségét az elfogultságok enyhítése érdekében. A szabványos adatkészletekkel és mutatókkal kapcsolatos kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt \\textff{Auto-Debias} megközelítésünk jelentősen csökkentheti az elfogultságokat, beleértve a nemi és faji elfogultságokat, olyan előkészített nyelvi modellekben, mint a BERT, RoBERTa és ALBERT. Ezenkívül a méltányosság javulása nem csökkenti a nyelvi modellek megértési képességét, amint azt a GLUE referenciaérték használatával mutatják.', 'it': "I pregiudizi umani e gli stereotipi sociali indesiderati esistono in grandi modelli linguistici pre-addestrati. Data l'ampia adozione di questi modelli nelle applicazioni del mondo reale, mitigare tali pregiudizi è diventato un compito emergente e importante. In questo articolo, proponiamo un metodo automatico per mitigare i pregiudizi nei modelli linguistici pre-addestrati. Diversamente dal precedente lavoro di debiasing che utilizza corpi esterni per mettere a punto i modelli pretrained, invece sondiamo direttamente i bias codificati nei modelli pretrained attraverso prompt. Nello specifico, proponiamo una variante del metodo di ricerca beam per cercare automaticamente \\textit{biased prompts} in modo che i completamenti in stile cloze siano i più diversi rispetto ai diversi gruppi demografici. Dati i suggerimenti parziali identificati, proponiamo quindi una perdita di allineamento della distribuzione per mitigare i pregiudizi. I risultati degli esperimenti su set di dati e metriche standard mostrano che il nostro approccio \\textbf{Auto-Debias} proposto può ridurre significativamente i pregiudizi, inclusi i pregiudizi razziali e di genere, in modelli linguistici pre-addestrati come BERT, RoBERTa e ALBERT. Inoltre, il miglioramento dell'equità non riduce le capacità di comprensione dei modelli linguistici, come dimostrato utilizzando il benchmark GLUE.", 'el': 'Οι ανθρώπινες προκαταλήψεις και τα ανεπιθύμητα κοινωνικά στερεότυπα υπάρχουν σε μεγάλα προκαθορισμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα. Δεδομένου της ευρείας υιοθέτησης αυτών των μοντέλων σε πραγματικές εφαρμογές, ο μετριασμός τέτοιων προκαταλήψεων έχει γίνει ένα αναδυόμενο και σημαντικό έργο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια αυτόματη μέθοδο μετριασμού των προκαταλήψεων σε προκαθορισμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα. Διαφορετικά από την προηγούμενη εργασία απομάκρυνσης που χρησιμοποιεί εξωτερικά σώματα για να συντονίσει τα προκαθορισμένα μοντέλα, αντιθέτως εξετάζουμε άμεσα τις προκαθορισμένες προκαθορισμένες σε προκαθορισμένα μοντέλα μέσω προτάσεων. Συγκεκριμένα, προτείνουμε μια παραλλαγή της μεθόδου αναζήτησης δέσμης για αυτόματη αναζήτηση για \\textit{προκατειλημμένες προτροπές} έτσι ώστε οι συμπληρωσεις τύπου κλόζε να είναι οι πιο διαφορετικές σε σχέση με διαφορετικές δημογραφικές ομάδες. Δεδομένης των προκατειλημμένων προτάσεων, στη συνέχεια προτείνουμε μια απώλεια ευθυγράμμισης κατανομής για να μετριάσουμε τις προκατάληψη. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων σε τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων και μετρήσεις δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να μειώσει σημαντικά τις προκαταλήψεις, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της φυλετικής και φυλετικής προκατάληψη, σε προκαθορισμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα όπως BERT, RoBERTa και ALBERT. Επιπλέον, η βελτίωση της δικαιοσύνης δεν μειώνει τις ικανότητες κατανόησης των γλωσσικών μοντέλων, όπως φαίνεται με τη χρήση του δείκτη αναφοράς GLUE.', 'kk': 'Адам сияқты өзгерістер мен қаламаған әлемдік стереотиптер үлкен тіл үлгілерінде бар. Бұл үлгілерді шын әлемдегі қолданбаларда көпшілікті қолдану үшін, бұл өзгерістерді көшірмелеу жақсы және маңызды тапсырма болды. Бұл қағазда біз автоматты түрде тіл үлгілерінде өзгерістерді азайту әдісін таңдаймыз. Алдыңғы дебияциялау жұмысынан айырмашылық, сыртқы корпора қолданатын моделдерді баптау үшін, біз оның орнына сұрақтар арқылы кодтамыз үлгілерде кодтамыз керек моделдеріне кодтамыз. Сәйкес, біз\\ textit{ biased prompts} дегенді автоматты түрде іздеу әдісінің аудармасын таңдаймыз, бұл үшін клос стилінің толтырулары әртүрлі демографиялық топтардың қасиетінде ең әртүрлі. Көрсетілген жұмыс сұрақтарын көрсету үшін үлестірімізді өзгерту үшін қолданып тастаймыз. Стандартты деректер қорларының мен метрикалық тәжірибелерінің нәтижелері біздің ұсынысымыз\\ textbf{ Auto- Debias} қасиеті, гендер және расалық тәжірибелерді, мысалы BERT, RoBERTa және ALBERT секілді тіл үлгілерінде, өзгерт Сонымен қатар, ақиқаттылық үлгілердің түсіну мүмкіндіктерін, GLUE бағдарламасынан көрсетілген сияқты, түсіну мүмкіндіктерін азайтпайды.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരെപ്പോലെയുള്ള പിശാചുക്കളും അപരിചിതമായ സാമൂഹ്യസ്ഥിതികളും വലിയ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഈ മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ വിശാലമായ പ്രോഗ്രാപ്തികള്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഇത്തരം പ്ര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വയമായ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രാന്തികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള തെറ്റുകള്\u200d മുളപ്പിക പുറത്തുള്ള കോർപ്പോർണയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രത്യേക മോഡലുകളിൽ നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളിൽ നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, പ്രാപ്റ്റുകളി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ബീമിന്റെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d രീതിയിലെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായി തെരയുവാന്\u200d \\ടെക്സ്റ്റിറ്റ് {പ്രോപ്റ്റ്സ്} വ്യത്യസ്തമായി തെരച്ചിലേക്ക് നാം  തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെട്ട പ്രോപ്റ്റുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് നഷ്ടമാണ്. സാധാരണ ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റുകളുടെയും മെട്രിക്കങ്ങളുടെയും പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു \\ടെക്സ്റ്റോബിയസ്\\ അതുകൊണ്ടും, നീതിയിലുള്ള മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ മനസ്സിലുള്ള കഴിവുകള്\u200d കുറവ് വരുത്തുന്നില്ല, ജില്\u200d', 'mk': "Човечките предрасуди и нежелните социјални стереотипи постојат во големи предобучени јазички модели. Given the wide adoption of these models in real-world applications, mitigating such biases has become an emerging and important task.  Во овој весник предложуваме автоматски метод за намалување на предрасудените јазички модели. Different from previous debiasing work that uses external corpora to fine-tune the pretrained models, we instead directly probe the biases encoded in pretrained models through prompts.  Специфично, предложуваме варијант на методот на пребарување по прозорец за автоматски пребарување на \\textit{biased prompts} така што комплетирањата во стилот на затворање се најразлични во однос на различните демографски групи. Со оглед на идентификуваните пристрасни поттици, потоа предложуваме загуба на распределбата за намалување на пристрасните поттици. Резултатите од експериментите на стандардните податоци и метрики покажуваат дека нашиот предложен пристап \\textbf{Auto- Debias} може значително да ги намали предрасудите, вклучително и половите и расните предрасуди, во предобучените јазички модели како што се BERT, RoBERTa и ALBERT. Moreover, the improvement in fairness does not decrease the language models' understanding abilities, as shown using the GLUE benchmark.", 'ms': 'Human-like biases and undesired social stereotypes exist in large pretrained language models.  Berdasarkan pengadopsi luas model ini dalam aplikasi dunia nyata, mengurangi bias seperti ini telah menjadi tugas yang muncul dan penting. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah automatik untuk mengurangi bias dalam model bahasa yang dilatih. Different from previous debiasing work that uses external corpora to fine-tune the pretrained models, we instead directly probe the biases encoded in pretrained models through prompts.  Secara khusus, kami cadangkan variasi kaedah carian cahaya untuk secara automatik mencari \\textit{prompt biased} sehingga pelengkapan gaya-kloze adalah yang paling berbeza dengan kumpulan demografik berbeza. Mengingat maklumat bias yang dikenalpasti, kita akan melamar kehilangan jajaran distribusi untuk mengurangkan bias. Experiment results on standard datasets and metrics show that our proposed \\textbf{Auto-Debias} approach can significantly reduce biases, including gender and racial bias, in pretrained language models such as BERT, RoBERTa and ALBERT.  Lagipun, peningkatan keadilan tidak mengurangkan kemampuan pemahaman model bahasa, seperti yang dipaparkan menggunakan tanda referensi GLUE.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтөн шиг харилцаа болон хүсээгүй нийгмийн стереотипүүд маш том хэл загвар дээр байдаг. Эдгээр загваруудыг бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглээнд хүлээн зөвшөөрсөн учраас ийм загваруудыг багасгах нь шинэ, чухал ажил болсон. Энэ цаасан дээр бид автоматик арга зам нь хэл загваруудыг багасгах боломжтой. Өмнөх давхар загварыг ашиглан гадаад корпора хэрэглэдэг загваруудыг сайжруулахын тулд өөр өөр өөр өөр зүйлсийн оронд бид шууд давхар загваруудын шинжлэх загваруудыг судалж байна. Тодорхой хэлбэл, бид хайлтын арга замыг автоматаар \\textit{biased prompts} хайх боломжтой хувилбарыг санал болгож байна. Яг л цохилт хэлбэрийн бүтээлүүд өөр демографик бүлгүүдэд хамгийн ялгаатай. Одоо тодорхойлогдсон, хувьсгал хөдлөл байдлыг багасгахын тулд бид хувьсгал хөдлөл байдлыг бууруулахын тулд санал өгдөг. Стандарттай өгөгдлийн санг болон метриктикийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал болгосон \\textbf{Auto-Debias} арга баримтууд гендер болон урсгалын өрөөсгөл байдлыг багасгаж болно. БЕРТ, РОБЕРТА, АлБЕРТ зэрэг өмнөх хэл загварууды Түүнчлэн шударга байдлын сайжруулалт нь хэл загварын ойлголтын чадварыг багасгаж чадахгүй. ГЛUE багасгал хэрэглэгддэг.', 'no': 'Det finst i store språk-modeller som er sett til menneskelige forvirkningar og undesirerte sosiale stereotypar. Gjennomsiktig at desse modelane er gjennomført i verkeleg programmer, har det blitt ein oppgåve og viktig oppgåve å redusera slike forsikt. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein automatisk metode for å redusera forsvinningane i språk-modeller. Forskjellig frå førre debiasing-arbeid som brukar eksterne korpora for å finne opp dei pretrende modelane. I staden prøver vi direkte forskjellingane koda i pretrende modeller gjennom spørsmål. I spesifikke tilbyr vi ein variant av søkjemotoden for stråm for automatisk søk etter\\\\ textit{ biased prompts}, slik at fullføringa av klossstilen er dei mest ulike med forskjellige demografiske grupper. Gjennomsikt dei identifiserte spørsmålene, foreslår vi så ein tap av fordelingsjusteringa for å redusera forsvinningane. Eksperimentresultatet på standardsetar og metrikar viser at vårt foreslått tilnærming \\textbf{Auto-Debias} kan significativt redusere forsvinningar, inkludert seks- og rask- forsvinning, i språk- modeller som BERT, RoBERTa og ALBERT. Bestemmer, forbetringa i rettigheten reduserer ikkje forståkinga av språmodellen, som vist ved hjelp av GLUE-benchmarket.', 'pl': 'Ludzkie uprzedzenia i niepożądane stereotypy społeczne istnieją w dużych wcześniej przygotowanych modelach językowych. Biorąc pod uwagę szerokie przyjęcie tych modeli w zastosowaniach rzeczywistych, łagodzenie takich uprzedzeń stało się pojawiającym się i ważnym zadaniem. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy automatyczną metodę łagodzenia uprzedzeń w uprzednio przeszkolonych modelach językowych. W odróżnieniu od poprzednich prac debiacing, które wykorzystują zewnętrzne korpusy do dostrojenia wstępnie trenowanych modeli, zamiast tego bezpośrednio badamy uprzedzenia zakodowane w wstępnie trenowanych modelach poprzez promenty. W szczególności proponujemy wariant metody wyszukiwania wiązki automatycznego wyszukiwania \\textit{uprzedzone prompty} tak, aby uzupełnienia w stylu cloze były najbardziej różne w odniesieniu do różnych grup demograficznych. Biorąc pod uwagę zidentyfikowane stronnicze wskazówki, proponujemy stratę wyrównania dystrybucji, aby złagodzić te stronnicze. Wyniki eksperymentów na standardowych zbiorach danych i wskaźnikach pokazują, że proponowane przez nas podejście \\textbf{Auto-Debias} może znacznie zmniejszyć uprzedzenia, w tym uprzedzenia płci i rasy, w uprzednio przeszkolonych modelach językowych, takich jak BERT, RoBERTa i ALBERT. Co więcej, poprawa uczciwości nie zmniejsza umiejętności zrozumienia modeli językowych, jak pokazano przy użyciu referencji GLUE.', 'ro': 'Prejudecăți asemănătoare omului și stereotipuri sociale nedorite există în modele lingvistice mari pre-instruite. Având în vedere adoptarea largă a acestor modele în aplicațiile din lumea reală, atenuarea acestor prejudecăți a devenit o sarcină emergentă și importantă. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă automată de atenuare a prejudecăților în modelele lingvistice pre-instruite. Diferit de lucrarea anterioară de debiasing care folosește corpore externe pentru a regla fin modelele pre-instruite, în schimb sondăm direct prejudecățile codificate în modele pre-instruite prin solicitări. Mai exact, propunem o variantă a metodei de căutare a fasciculului pentru a căuta automat \\textit{prompts partised} astfel încât completările în stil cloze să fie cele mai diferite în raport cu diferitele grupuri demografice. Având în vedere solicitările părtinitoare identificate, propunem apoi o pierdere de aliniere a distribuției pentru a atenua părtinitoarele. Rezultatele experimentelor asupra seturilor de date standard și măsurătorilor arată că abordarea noastră propusă \\textbf{Auto-Debias} poate reduce semnificativ prejudecățile, inclusiv părtinirea de gen și rasială, în modele lingvistice precum BERT, RoBERTa și ALBERT. Mai mult decât atât, îmbunătățirea echității nu reduce capacitățile de înțelegere ale modelelor lingvistice, așa cum se arată utilizând criteriul de referință GLUE.', 'sr': 'Ljudske predrasude i neočekivane socijalne stereotipe postoje u velikim jezičkim modelima. S obzirom na široko usvajanje tih modela u stvarnom svetskom aplikaciji, smanjenje takvih predrasuda postalo je novi i važan zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo automatsku metodu za smanjenje predrasude u obrezanim jezičkim modelima. Drugačije od prethodnog debijazijskog rada koji koristi vanjsku korporaciju kako bi upravljali pretkišenim modelima, umjesto toga mi direktno istražujemo predrasude kodirane u pretkišenim modelima kroz brzinu. Posebno, predlažemo variant metode pretraživanja zraka da automatski potraži \\textit{predrasude prompt} tako da su kompleti stila kloza najrazličiti u odnosu na različite demografske grupe. S obzirom na identifikovane predrasude, onda predlažemo gubitak poravnanja distribucije da smanjimo predrasude. Rezultati eksperimentacija na standardnim setima podataka i metrika pokazuju da naš predloženi pristup tekstbf{Auto-Debias} može značajno smanjiti predrasude, uključujući spol i rasne predrasude, u pretreniranim jezičkim modelima poput BERT, RoBERTa i ALBERT. Osim toga, poboljšanje poštenosti ne smanjuje sposobnosti razumevanja jezičkih modela, kao što je pokazalo korištenjem referencije GLUE.', 'lt': 'Human-like biases and undesired social stereotypes exist in large pretrained language models.  Atsižvelgiant į plataus masto šių modelių taikymą realiajame pasaulyje, tokių pusiausvyrų mažinimas tapo nauja ir svarbia užduotis. Šiame dokumente siūlome automatinį metodą, kuriuo būtų sušvelnintos išankstinio mokymo kalbų modelių pusiausvyros. Skirtingai nuo ankstesnio debijavimo darbo, kuris naudoja išorinę korprą, kad patobulintų iš anksto apmokytus modelius, mes vietoj to tiesiogiai ištiriame nukrypimus, koduotus iš anksto apmokytuose modeliuose, per įspėjimus. Specifically, we propose a variant of the beam search method to automatically search for \\textit{biased prompts} such that the cloze-style completions are the most different with respect to different demographic groups.  Given the identified  biased prompts, we then propose a distribution alignment loss to mitigate the biases.  Eksperimentų su standartiniais duomenų rinkiniais ir metriniais rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų pasiūlytas \\textbf{Auto-Debias} metodas gali gerokai sumažinti nukreipimus nuo lyties ir rasinės pakreipimo į išankstinio mokymo kalbų modelius, pvz., BERT, RoBERTa ir ALBERT. Be to, teisingumo gerinimas nesumažina kalbų modelių supratimo gebėjimų, kaip parodyta naudojant GLUE lyginamąjį rodiklį.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ අවශ්\u200dනයක් නැති සාමාජික ස්ටරියෝප් වල ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාෂා ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ වැඩි මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් පිරිසිදු දෙබියාස් වැඩයෙන් පිරිසිදු කොර්පෝරාව භාවිත කරනවා ප්\u200dරතිරිසිදු මොඩේල් එක සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරිසිද්ධි විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන්ම \\textit{biosed promptis} හොයාගන්න බීම් සොයාගැනීම විදිහක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ක්\u200dලොස්  පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ∙ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට, අපි පස්සේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරමාණික දත්ත සැටි සහ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය \\textbf{Auto-debas} ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය සහ වාසික ඒ වගේම, සාධාර්යත්වයේ වැඩි වැඩි වෙන්නේ භාෂා මෝඩේල්ගේ තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් අඩු වෙන්නේ නෑ, GLUE බෙන', 'so': "Dhaqdhaqaaq u eg dadka iyo cilmiga bulshada ee aan la falin waxay ku jiraan qaabab badan oo afka hore. Sidii loo kordhiyey modelladan oo ballaadhan codsiyada caalamiga ah, lagula dhigo khiyaanada caynkaas ah waxay noqotay shaqo soo socda oo muhiim ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qaab automati ah oo aan ku qiyaasto tababarida sameynta afka hore. Shaqooyinkii hore ee baabba'da ah oo isticmaalaya shirkadaha dibadda si aan u hagaajinno modellada hore, si toos ah ayaannu u caddaynaynaa dabeecada lagu qoray sameynta hore ee sameynta. Si gaar ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa hababka raadinta ee nidaamka si aan automatic u raadinno textit {biased prompts} sida dhamaanka kooxaha kala duduwan oo ay u kala duwan yihiin kooxaha kala duduwan. Sida lagu xaqiijiyey soonaha la aqoonsaday, waxaynu horumarinaynaa khasaarada isbedelashada si ay u fududaato tababarida. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda kooxaha danbiyada iyo metricka ka soo jeeda in la soo jeedo qoraalkayaga (Auto-Debias) uu si weyn u hoosaysiin karo tababarada, including jinsiga iyo midabka rasmiga ah, tusaale ahaan modelalka afka hore ee BERT, RoBERTA iyo ALBERT. Sidoo kale hagaajinta caddaaladda ma hoosayso aqoonta waxgarashada tusaalaha afka, sida loo muujiyo isticmaalka qoraalka GLUE.", 'sv': 'Mänskliga fördomar och oönskade sociala stereotyper finns i stora förkränade språkmodeller. Med tanke på det breda införandet av dessa modeller i verkliga tillämpningar har det blivit en viktig uppgift att mildra sådana fördomar. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en automatisk metod för att mildra fördomarna i förkränade språkmodeller. Till skillnad från tidigare debiasing arbete som använder externa corpora för att finjustera de förkränade modellerna, undersöker vi istället direkt de fördomar som kodats i förkränade modeller genom prompts. Specifikt föreslår vi en variant av strålsökningsmetoden för att automatiskt söka efter \\textit{partised prompts} så att cloze-stil kompletteringar är de mest olika med avseende på olika demografiska grupper. Med tanke på de identifierade partiska uppmaningarna föreslår vi sedan en förlust av fördelningsanpassning för att mildra biasen. Experimentsresultat på standarddatauppsättningar och mätvärden visar att vårt föreslagna \\textf{Auto-Debias}-tillvägagångssätt avsevärt kan minska fördomar, inklusive köns- och rasbias, i förtrränade språkmodeller som BERT, RoBERTa och ALBERT. Dessutom minskar inte förbättringen av rättvisan språkmodellernas förståelse, vilket framgår av GLUE-riktmärket.', 'ta': 'மனிதன் போன்ற பிரச்சனைகள் மற்றும் எதிர்பாராத சமூக நிலையான வகைகள் பெரிய மொழி மாதிரிகளில் உள்ளன. உண்மையான உலக பயன்பாடுகளில் இந்த மாதிரிகளை பெற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ளது, இத்தகைய பிரச்சனைகளை குறைக்கும் போது ஏற்படும் முக இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு தானியங்கி முறைமையை குறைக்க முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகளில் செயல்பாடுகளை அள முந்தைய பிழைநீக்கும் வேலையிலிருந்து வேறுபாடு வெளி நிறுவனத்தை பயன்படுத்தி மாதிரிகளை நன்றாக ஒட்டுக்கொள்கிறது, நாம் நேரடியாக மு குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் தானாகவே தேடுவதற்கான beam தேடும் முறையின் மாறுபாட்டை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கிறோம் \\textit {biased prompts} அதாவது குளிக்கும் பாணி முழுமை கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட விருப்பங்கள் கொடுத்து, பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு பங்கீட்டு ஒழுங்கீட்டு இழப்பை குறைக்க பரிந்துர நிலையான தரவுத்தளங்கள் மற்றும் மேட்ரிக் முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது \\textbf {auto- Debias} நெருக்கம் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகளில் BERT, ரோபிரேட் மற்றும் ALBERT போன்ற மொ மேலும், நீதியில் முன்னேற்றத்தை மொழி மாதிரிகளின் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் திறனை குறைக்கவில்லை, GLUE பென்க்ரேக் பயன', 'mt': "Il-preġudizzji simili għall-bniedem u l-isterjotipi soċjali mhux mixtieqa jeżistu f’mudelli kbar ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel. Minħabba l-adozzjoni wiesgħa ta’ dawn il-mudelli fl-applikazzjonijiet tad-dinja reali, it-tnaqqis ta’ tali preġudizzji sar kompitu emerġenti u importanti. In this paper, we propose an automatic method to mitigate the biases in pretrained language models.  B’differenza mix-xogħol ta’ debizzar preċedenti li juża korpra esterna biex itaffi l-mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel, minflok aħna nistudjaw direttament il-preġudizzji kkodifikati f’mudelli mħarrġa minn qabel permezz ta’ prompts. B'mod speċifiku, qed nipproponu varjant tal-metodu tat-tiftix tar-raġġ biex ifittxu awtomatikament \\textit{biased prompts} b'tali mod li l-komplimenti tal-istil tal-għeluq huma l-aktar differenti fir-rigward ta' gruppi demografiċi differenti. Minħabba l-inċentivi identifikati bi preġudizzju, imbagħad nipproponu telf ta’ allinjament tad-distribuzzjoni biex jittaffew il-preġudizzji. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta u metriċi standard juru li l-approċċ \\textbf{Auto-Debias} propost tagħna jista’ jnaqqas b’mod sinifikanti l-preġudizzji, inklużi l-preġudizzji bejn is-sessi u r-razza, f’mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel bħall-BERT, RoBERTa u ALBERT. Barra minn hekk, it-titjib fil-ġustizzja ma jnaqqas l-abbiltajiet ta’ fehim tal-mudelli lingwistiċi, kif muri bl-użu tal-parametru referenzjarju GLUE.", 'ur': 'انسان کی طرح کی مخالفت اور ناپسندیدہ سائل سٹیریوٹیپ بڑی زبان کی مدل میں موجود ہیں. یہ مدلکوں کی وسیع قبول کی وجہ سے حقیقی دنیا کی کاربریوں میں، اس طرح کی مخالفت کو کمزور کرنے کا ایک اہم اور اہم کام ہوگیا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک آٹوٹی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ پہلے زبان مدلکوں میں عاجزی کریں۔ پہلے کے دبیزانگ کے کاموں سے متفاوت ہیں جو باہر کی کوپرا کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ پررینڈ موڈل کو ٹھیک ٹھیک سمجھنے کے لئے، ہم اس عوض مستقیماً پررینڈ موڈل کے ذریعے سیدھے سیدھے سیدھے مطابق تحقیق کریں گے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم نے بئم تلاش طریقے کی ایک متغیر پیشنهاد کرتا ہے تاکہ \\textit{biased prompts} کو اپنا تلاش کریں، جیسا کہ کلوز طریقے پورا کرنا مختلف دموگرافیک گروپ کے بارے میں سب سے مختلف ہے. پیدا کیا گیا تھا ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ ۔ استاندارد ڈاٹ سٹ اور متریک پر تجربے کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی \\textbf{Auto-Debias} تقریبا، جنس اور نژادی بحث کے شامل ہونے کے مطابق جنس اور نژادی بحث کے ذریعہ سے کم کر سکتا ہے، جیسے BERT, RoBERTa اور ALBERT کی زبان مدل میں۔ اور نیکی کے ساتھ، انصاف کے لحاظ کی تدبیر زبان مدل کے سمجھنے کی قابلیت کم نہیں کرتا، جیسے GLUE بانچم مارک کے مطابق دکھائی جاتی ہے.', 'vi': 'Nhân loại và các mẫu rập khuôn xã hội không mong đợi tồn tại trong các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn. Dựa vào việc nhận diện rộng rãi các mô hình này trong các ứng dụng trên thế giới thực, giảm thiểu các giả lập này đã trở thành một nhiệm vụ mới và quan trọng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp tự động giảm độc tố trong các mô hình ngôn ngữ trước. Khác với những công việc thiếu nợ trước sử dụng cơ thể bên ngoài để chỉnh sửa các mô hình trước, chúng tôi thay vào đó thăm dò trực tiếp các tội danh được mã hóa trong các mô hình premưa qua đường nhắc. Cụ thể, chúng tôi đề xuất một biến thể của phương pháp tìm tia sáng để tự động tìm kiếm các lời nhắc nhấn nhấn nhấn nhấn: khiến các phức hợp kiểu quần quật là khác nhau nhất với các nhóm dân số khác nhau. Dựa vào các yếu tố được xác định, chúng tôi đề nghị giảm bớt các giả thuyết. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên các tập tin và đo hồ sơ tiêu chuẩn cho thấy khả năng ứng dụng của chúng ta có thể giảm đáng kể bệnh tật, bao gồm tính giới tính và phân biệt chủng tộc, trong các mô hình ngôn ngữ premưa như BERT, Roqua BERB và ALBERT. Hơn nữa, sự cải thiện sự công bằng không làm giảm khả năng hiểu biết của các mô- đun ngôn ngữ, như được hiển thị bằng vật tiêu chuẩn GLUE.', 'uz': "Human-like biases and undesired social stereotypes exist in large pretrained language models.  Bu modellarni butunlay dunyodagi dasturlarda yozib olishda, bu tablarni kamaytirish juda muhim vazifa bo'ldi. Bu qogʻozda, biz o'ylab kelgan til modellarida o'zgarishni avtomatik o'zgartirish usulini talab qilamiz. Name @ info Koʻrsatilgan tashkilotlar bilan, keyin biz tashkilotlarni kamaytirish uchun tarqatishni taqdim qilamiz. Name Ko'rsatilgan, o'zgarishning o'zgarishni o'zgartirish tilning modellarining imkoniyatlarini kamaytirish imkoniyatini kamaytirish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Човешките пристрастия и нежеланите социални стереотипи съществуват в големите, предварително обучени езикови модели. Предвид широкото приемане на тези модели в реалните приложения, смекчаването на тези пристрастия се превърна в възникваща и важна задача. В настоящата статия предлагаме автоматичен метод за смекчаване на пристрастията в предварително тренирани езикови модели. За разлика от предишната работа по дебиазиране, която използва външни корпуси за фино настройване на предварително тренираните модели, ние директно изследваме отклоненията, кодирани в предварително тренирани модели чрез подкани. По-конкретно, предлагаме вариант на метода за търсене на лъчи, за да се търси автоматично \\пристрастени подкани} така, че завършванията в стил клоз да са най-различни по отношение на различните демографски групи. Предвид идентифицираните предубедени подкани, след това предлагаме загуба на подравняване на разпределението, за да смекчим предразсъдъците. Резултатите от експериментите върху стандартни набори от данни и показатели показват, че предложеният ни подход може значително да намали пристрастията, включително половото и расовото пристрастие, в предварително обучени езикови модели като BERT, RoBERTa и ALBERT. Освен това подобряването на справедливостта не намалява способността на езиковите модели да разбират, както е показано с помощта на референтния показател GLUE.', 'da': 'Menneskelignende fordomme og uønskede sociale stereotyper findes i store forudtrænede sprogmodeller. I betragtning af den brede anvendelse af disse modeller i den virkelige verden er det blevet en vigtig opgave at afbøde sådanne fordomme. I denne artikel foreslår vi en automatisk metode til at afbøde fordommene i forudtrænede sprogmodeller. Forskellig fra tidligere debiasing arbejde, der bruger eksterne corpora til at finjustere de forudtrænede modeller, undersøger vi i stedet direkte de fordele, der er kodet i forudtrænede modeller gennem prompts. Specielt foreslår vi en variant af strålesøgemetoden til automatisk at søge efter \\textit{partised prompts} således at cloze-stil kompletteringer er de mest forskellige i forhold til forskellige demografiske grupper. I betragtning af de identificerede fordomsfulde spørgsmål foreslår vi derefter et tab af fordelingsjustering for at afbøde fordommene. Eksperimentelle resultater på standard datasæt og metrics viser, at vores foreslåede \\textbf{Auto-Debias} tilgang kan reducere fordomme, herunder køn og race bias, i forudgående sprogmodeller som BERT, RoBERTa og ALBERT. Desuden nedsætter forbedringen af retfærdigheden ikke sprogmodellenes forståelsesevne, som det fremgår af GLUE-benchmark.', 'nl': 'Menselijke vooroordelen en ongewenste sociale stereotypen bestaan in grote vooraf getrainde taalmodellen. Gezien de brede toepassing van deze modellen in de praktijk, is het verminderen van dergelijke vooroordelen een opkomende en belangrijke taak geworden. In dit artikel stellen we een automatische methode voor om de vooroordelen in voorgetrainde taalmodellen te verminderen. Anders dan vorig debiasing werk dat externe corpora gebruikt om de vooraf getrainde modellen te finetunen, onderzoeken we in plaats daarvan direct de biases die in vooraf getrainde modellen zijn gecodeerd door middel van prompts. Specifiek stellen we een variant voor van de beam search methode om automatisch te zoeken naar \\textit{biased prompts} zodat de cloze-stijl completies het meest verschillend zijn met betrekking tot verschillende demografische groepen. Gezien de geïdentificeerde biased prompts, stellen we dan een distributieuitlijningsverlies voor om de biases te verminderen. Experimentele resultaten op standaard datasets en metrics tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde \\textbf{Auto-Debias} benadering vooroordelen, waaronder gender en raciale vooroordelen, aanzienlijk kan verminderen in vooraf getrainde taalmodellen zoals BERT, RoBERTa en ALBERT. Bovendien vermindert de verbetering van eerlijkheid niet de verstaanbaarheid van de taalmodellen, zoals blijkt uit de GLUE benchmark.', 'de': 'Menschliche Vorurteile und unerwünschte soziale Stereotypen existieren in großen vortrainierten Sprachmodellen. Angesichts der breiten Akzeptanz dieser Modelle in realen Anwendungen ist es zu einer neuen und wichtigen Aufgabe geworden, solche Vorurteile abzubauen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine automatische Methode vor, um die Verzerrungen in vortrainierten Sprachmodellen zu mildern. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Debiasing-Arbeiten, die externe Korpora zur Feinabstimmung der vortrainierten Modelle verwenden, untersuchen wir stattdessen direkt die Biases, die in vortrainierten Modellen kodiert wurden, durch Eingabeaufforderungen. Konkret schlagen wir eine Variante der Beam-Suchmethode vor, um automatisch nach \\textit{biased prompts} zu suchen, so dass die Cloze-Stil-Vervollständigungen in Bezug auf verschiedene demografische Gruppen am meisten unterschiedlich sind. Angesichts der identifizierten verzerrten Prompts schlagen wir dann einen Verteilungsausgleich vor, um die Verzerrungen zu mildern. Experimente mit Standarddatensätzen und Metriken zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagener \\textbf{Auto-Debias}-Ansatz in vortrainierten Sprachmodellen wie BERT, RoBERTa und ALBERT Biases signifikant reduzieren kann. Darüber hinaus verringert die Verbesserung der Fairness nicht die Verständnisfähigkeit der Sprachmodelle, wie anhand des GLUE Benchmarks gezeigt wird.', 'hr': 'U velikim jezičkim modelima postoje predrasude poput ljudi i neočekivane socijalne stereotipe. S obzirom na široko usvajanje tih modela u stvarnom svijetu primjene, smanjenje takvih predrasuda postalo je pojavljujući i važan zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo automatsku metodu za smanjenje predrasude u pretkivnim jezičkim modelima. Drugačije od prethodnog debijacijskog rada koji koristi vanjsku tijelo kako bi upravljali pretkišenim modelima, umjesto toga mi direktno probamo predrasude kodirane u pretkišenim modelima kroz brzinu. Posebno, predlažemo variant metode pretraživanja zraka automatski tražiti \\ textit {predrasude prompt} tako da su kompleti stila kloza najrazličiti u pogledu različitih demografskih grupa. S obzirom na identificirane predrasude, onda predlažemo gubitak poravnanja distribucije kako bi smanjili predrasude. Rezultati iskustva na standardnim setima podataka i metrike pokazuju da naš predloženi pristup \\textbf{Auto-Debias} može značajno smanjiti predrasude, uključujući spol i rasne predrasude, u pretkinutom jezičkim modelima poput BERT, RoBERTa i ALBERT. Nadalje, poboljšanje pravednosti ne smanjuje sposobnosti razumijevanja jezičkih modela, kao što je pokazalo korištenjem referencije GLUE-a.', 'id': 'Kebiasaan seperti manusia dan stereotipe sosial tidak diinginkan ada dalam model bahasa besar yang dilatih. Mengingat adopsi yang luas dari model ini dalam aplikasi dunia nyata, mengurangi bias tersebut telah menjadi tugas yang muncul dan penting. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode otomatis untuk mengurangi bias dalam model bahasa yang dilatih. Berbeda dari pekerjaan debiasing sebelumnya yang menggunakan corpora luar untuk memperbaiki model yang dilatih, kami malah secara langsung menguji biases yang dikodekan dalam model yang dilatih melalui prompts. Secara spesifik, kami mengusulkan varian dari metode pencarian cahaya untuk secara otomatis mencari \\textit{prompt biased} sehingga lengkap gaya kloze adalah yang paling berbeda dengan kelompok demografis berbeda. Dengan mengidentifikasi petunjuk bias, kami kemudian mengusulkan kehilangan penyesuaian distribusi untuk mengurangi bias. Hasil eksperimen pada set data standar dan metrik menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan \\textbf{Auto-Debias} kami yang diusulkan dapat mengurangi secara signifikan biases, termasuk gender dan bias rasial, dalam model bahasa terlatih seperti BERT, RoBERTa dan ALBERT. Selain itu, peningkatan keadilan tidak mengurangi kemampuan pemahaman model bahasa, seperti yang ditunjukkan menggunakan benchmark GLUE.', 'ko': '인간의 편견과 환영을 받지 못하는 사회의 판에 박힌 인상은 대량의 사전 훈련 언어 모델에 존재한다.이러한 모델이 현실 세계에서 광범위하게 응용되고 있음을 감안하여 이러한 편견을 완화시키는 것은 이미 신흥하고 중요한 임무가 되었다.본고에서 우리는 예훈련 언어 모델의 편견을 완화시키는 자동 방법을 제시했다.이전에 외부 어료 라이브러리에서 미조정 예행 훈련 모델을 사용한 차용 작업과 달리 우리는 제시를 통해 예행 훈련 모델에서 인코딩된 편차를 직접 탐지한다.구체적으로 말하면 우리는 beam 검색 방법의 변체를 제시했는데 자동적으로 \\textit {biasted prompts}를 검색할 수 있다. 이렇게 완형 빈칸 채우기 스타일의 완성 방식은 서로 다른 인구통계학 그룹에서 차이가 가장 크다.식별된 편차 제시를 감안하여 우리는 뒤이어 분포 정렬 손실을 제기하여 편차를 완화시켰다.표준 데이터 세트와 지표에 대한 실험 결과에 따르면, 우리가 제시한 \\textbf{Auto Debias} 방법은 성별과 인종적 편견을 포함한 예비 훈련 언어 모델(예를 들어 BERT, RoBERTA, ALBERT)의 편견을 현저하게 줄일 수 있다.또한 공평성이 높아지면 언어 모델의 이해 능력을 떨어뜨리지 않는다. 예를 들어 GLUE 기준 테스트를 사용하는 것과 같다.', 'sw': 'Upendeleo kama binadamu na tabia za kijamii zisizo na msimamo mkali wa lugha. Kutokana na utekelezaji wa mifano haya katika matumizi ya dunia halisi, uchunguzi wa upendeleo huu umekuwa kazi inayotokea na muhimu. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya kujitokeza kupunguza upendeleo katika mifano ya lugha iliyopigwa. Tofauti na kazi zilizopita za mabadiliko yanayotumia kampuni ya nje ili kuweka vizuri vizuri mifano yaliyotangazwa, badala yake tunathibitisha upendeleo uliokuwa umewekwa katika mifano ya kudanganya kupitia haraka. Kwa ujumla, tunapendekeza tofauti ya utafutaji wa wima wa wima ili kutafuta teknolojia{maendeleo ya upinzani} kama vile vigezo vingi tofauti zaidi na kuhusiana na makundi tofauti ya watu. Kutokana na matamko yanayotambuliwa, kisha tunapendekeza kupoteza usambazaji wa usambazaji ili kupunguza upendeleo. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti za taarifa za kawaida na mbinu zinaonyesha kwamba pendekezo letu \\textbook {Auto-Debias} mbinu zetu zinaweza kupunguza upendeleo mkubwa, ikiwa ni pamoja na upendeleo wa kijinsia na ubaguzi wa rangi, katika mifano ya lugha zilizotengenezwa kama vile BERT, RoBERTa na ALBERT. Zaidi ya hayo, kuboreshwa kwa uadilifu haupunguzi uwezo wa kuelewa kwa mifano ya lugha, kama ilivyoonyeshwa kwa kutumia bendera ya GLUE.', 'fa': 'در مدل\u200cهای زبانی زیادی پیش\u200cفرض شده\u200cاند، پیش\u200cفرض\u200cهای مانند انسان\u200cها و استریو\u200cهای اجتماعی ناخواسته\u200cای وجود دارد. با وجود adoption wide of these models in real-world applications, mitigating such biases has become a emerging and important task. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش اتوماتیک پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا در مدل\u200cهای زبانی پیش\u200cفرض کند. متفاوت از کارهای پیشینی که از شرکت خارجی استفاده می\u200cکند تا مدل\u200cهای پیشینیان را درست کند، به جای اینکه مستقیما در مدل\u200cهای پیشینیان کودک شده به طریق پیشینیان تحقیق کنیم. به طور خاصی، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک متغیر از روش جستجوی ابر برای جستجوی خودکار برای جستجوی\\ textit{ پیشنهاد متغیر} همانند که تمام کردن طرح کلوز با گروه\u200cهای دموگرافیک مختلف متفاوت\u200cترین است. با توجه به پيشنهاد شناسايي و پيشنهاد مخالفت، بعد از اين پيشنهاد مي کنيم که از دست دادن توزيع براي کم کردن پيشنهاد توزيع بشه. نتایج تجربه\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای استاندارد و متریک نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور پیشنهاد ما \\textbf{Auto-Debias} می\u200cتواند به طور معمولی تغییرات را کاهش دهد، شامل جنسی و نژادی، در مدل\u200cهای زبانی پیشنهاد مانند BERT, RoBERTa و ALBERT. علاوه بر این، بهترین توجه به عدالت توانایی درک مدل زبانی را کاهش نمی\u200cکند، همانطور که با استفاده از نقاشی GLUE نشان داده می\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Adamlar ýaly biaslar we suçlamaýan sosialy stereotipler uly öňki dil nusgalarynda bar. Bu nusgalar hakyky dünýä uygulamalarynda örän uly göçüp kabul edildikde, şeýle bir sowgatlary azaltmak we wajyp bir zada bolup geçdi. Bu kagyzda, öňünden geçirilen dil nusgalaryny azaltmak üçin awtomatik bir yöntem teklip edýäris. Öňki debiýat işinden üýtgeşim şeklinde daşarydaky korpora önlenmiş modelleri düzeltmek üçin ullanýar. Bunun yerine, önlenmiş modellerde önlenmiş biçimlerini prompt bilen çykarmak üçin test ediyoruz. Adatça, beam arama yönteminiň üýtgewini otomatik gözlemek üçin \\textit{biased prompts} üçin çaplamak üçin üýtgewini teklip edýäris Tanyşan we biasy çaklamalaryna görä, soňra çykyş çykyşlygyny küçütmek üçin nusgala alýarys. Testler standart veri setirlerinde we metriklerde önlenen netijelerimiz \\textbf{Auto-Debias} teklipimizin önlenen çözümleri, cinsel we rasy biaslaryny, BERT, RoBERTa we ALBERT ýaly öňlenen dil modellerinde örän azatlap biler diýip görkezilýär. Munuň ýagdaýda, adalatly düzeltmek dil nusgalarynyň düşünüp biljek ukyplaryny azaltmaýar, ýaly GLUE düzeltmegi üçin görkezilýän çyzgymlary.', 'sq': 'Paragjykimet si njerëzit dhe stereotipet e padëshiruar shoqërore ekzistojnë në modele të mëdha gjuhësh të paratrajnuara. Duke pasur parasysh miratimin e gjerë të këtyre modeleve në aplikimet e botës reale, lehtësimi i paragjykimeve të tilla është bërë një detyrë e rëndësishme dhe në rritje. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë automatike për të lehtësuar paragjykimet në modelet e gjuhës së paramësuara. Ndryshe nga puna e mëparshme e debizimit që përdor korpra të jashtme për të rregulluar modelet e parastërvitura, ne në vend të kësaj hetojmë drejtpërdrejt paragjykimet e koduara në modelet e parastërvitura nëpërmjet kërkesave. Veçanërisht, ne propozojmë një variant të metodës së kërkimit të dritës për të kërkuar automatikisht për \\textit{kërkesa të paragjykimit} në mënyrë që kompletimi i stilit të mbylljes të jetë më i ndryshëm në lidhje me grupe të ndryshme demografike. Given the identified  biased prompts, we then propose a distribution alignment loss to mitigate the biases.  Rezultatet e eksperimenteve mbi të dhënat standarte dhe metrikat tregojnë se metoda jonë e propozuar \\textbf{Auto-Debias} mund të reduktojë ndjeshëm paragjykimet, duke përfshirë gjenerin dhe paragjykimin rasor, në modele gjuhësh të paramësuara të tilla si BERT, RoBERTa dhe ALBERT. Përveç kësaj, përmirësimi në drejtësi nuk zvogëlon aftësitë e kuptimit të modeleve gjuhësore, siç tregohet duke përdorur referencën GLUE.', 'af': "Mens-soos voorspoedies en onversoekte sosiale stereotipes bestaan in groot voorspoedige taal modele. Omdat die wyde aanvaar van hierdie modele in reël-wêreld toepassings, het sodanige voorspoedings verminder 'n opkommende en belangrike taak geword. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n outomatiese metode om die voorspoedies in die voorspoedige taal modele te verminder. Verskillende van vorige debiasing werk wat eksterne korpora gebruik om die pretreënde modele te fin-doen, ons in plaas direk probeer die voorspoedies gekodeer in pretreënde modele deur prompte. Spesifieke, ons voorstel 'n variant van die traam soektog metode om outomaties soek vir \\ textit {biased prompts} sodat die klose- styl voltooiings die mees verskillende is met respek na verskillende demografiese groepe. Gien die geïdentifiseerde „biased prompts”, voorstel ons dan 'n verspreiding-alignment verlies om die voorspoedings te verminder. Eksperiment resultate op standaard datastelle en metries vertoon dat ons voorgestelde \\textbf{Auto- Debias} toegang kan betekenlik verduur voorspoedies, insluitend gender en rasiese voorspoedies, in voorspoedige taal modele soos BERT, RoBERTa en ALBERT. Ook, die verbetering in regverdigheid verklein nie die taal modelles se verstandige moontlikhede nie, soos vertoon deur die GLUE benchmark te gebruik.", 'am': 'የሰው ብጤቶች እና የማይታወቀው ማኅበራዊ ድምፅ በተለየ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ውስጥ አሉ፡፡ በአውራዊ ዓለማዊ ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ ያሉትን ምሳሌዎች በተሰፋው ጊዜ፣ እንደነዚህ ሁኔታዎችን ለመቀላቀል እና የተጠቃሚ ስራ ሆነዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመጠቀም የራሳቸውን ሥርዓት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው የውጭ ኮርፖርት የሚጠቀሙትን አካባቢዎች በመጠቀም የተለየ የውጭ አካባቢዎችን በተለየ፣ በጽሑፎች ውስጥ የተዘጋጀውን የውይይት ዓይነቶች በአቅራቢያ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የደረጃ ምርጫዎች በተለያዩ የዴሞክራሲ ቡድኖች ላይ የተለየ ናቸው ብለን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የሚታወቁትን ተቃዋሚዎች ከታወቀ በኋላ የጉዳዩን ጉዳይ ለማሳካት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የድምፅ መፈተኛ ውጤቶች እና ማተሚያዎች የፕሮጀክት ጽሑፍ {auto-Debias} መግለጫችን በዝሙት እና የዘረኝነት ብሔራዊ የቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች እንደ BERT፣ ሮብERTA እና ALBERT በሚል የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በሙሉ ያጎድልማል፡፡ ደግሞም የGLUE መለያ በመጠቀም እንደሚያሳየው የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ማስተዋል ኃይል አያጎድልም፡፡', 'hy': 'Մարդկային նման կողմնականություններ և անցանկանալի սոցիալական կարծրատիպեր գոյություն ունեն մեծ նախադասական լեզվի մոդելներում: Եթե հաշվի առնենք այս մոդելների լայն ընդունությունը իրական աշխարհի ծրագրերում, նման կողմնականությունների նվազեցնելը դարձավ զարգացող և կարևոր խնդիր: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ավտոմատիկ մեթոդ, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք նախադասական լեզվի մոդելների կողմնականությունները: Ի տարբերություն նախորդ դիբիզացիայի աշխատանքից, որը օգտագործում է արտաքին մարմնի, որպեսզի բարելավենք նախօրինակված մոդելները, փոխարենը մենք անմիջապես ուսումնասիրում ենք նախօրինակված մոդելների կոդավորված կոդավորումները հարցերով: Specifically, we propose a variant of the beam search method to automatically search for \\textit{biased prompts} such that the cloze-style completions are the most different with respect to different demographic groups.  Եթե հաշվի առնենք հայտնաբերված կողմնակի ազդակները, ապա մենք առաջարկում ենք բաշխման հարմարեցման կորուստ կորցնելու համար կողմնակի ազդակների նվազեցնելու համար: Ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգերի և չափումների փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած \\TexBf{Auto- DeBias}- ի մոտեցումը կարող է նշանակալի չափ նվազեցնել կողմնականությունները, ներառյալ գենդերային և ռասային կողմնականությունը, նախադասում ուսու Ավելին, արդարության զարգացումը չի նվազեցնում լեզվի մոդելների հասկանալու ունակությունները, ինչպես ցույց է տալիս, օգտագործելով GLAE հարաբերականը:', 'az': 'İnsan kimi təsirlər və istəməyən sosyal stereotiplər böyük dil modellərdə mövcuddur. Bu modellərin çox dünya uyğulamalarında çoxluğuna görə, böyük tədbirləri azaltmaq yenidən və möhüm bir iş oldu. Bu kağızda, əvvəlki dil modellərində təsirlərini azaltmaq üçün avtomatik bir yol təklif edirik. Əvvəlki debiasing işindən fərqli olanlar, əvvəlki korpora modelləri təmizləmək üçün istifadə edirlər, biz onun yerinə təmizlənmiş modellərdə kodlanmış fərqliyi təmizləyirik. Özellikle, biz "textit{ biased prompts}" vasitəsini avtomatik olaraq axtarmaq üçün tram arama yönteminin variant əsini təbliğ edirik ki, kloz stili tamamlaması müxtəlif demografik qruplarına ən fərqli olar. Beləliklə tanındıqları təsirlərə görə, bu təsirləri azaltmaq üçün dağıtma təsirlərini təbliğ edirik. Standart verilənlər və metriklərin təcrübələrinin sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim təcrübəmiz \\textbf{Auto-Debias} approach, cins və ırkçı bias, BERT, RoBERTa və ALBERT kimi əvvəlki dil modellərdə, cins və rasal bias içərisində çox azaldır. Daha sonra, ədalətli işlər düzəltməsi, GLUE benchmark vasitəsilə göstərilən dil modellərinin anlama qabiliyyətini əskiltməz.', 'bs': 'U velikim jezičkim modelima postoje predrasude kao što su ljudi i neočekivani socijalni stereotipi. S obzirom na široko usvajanje tih modela u realnim aplikacijama, smanjenje takvih predrasuda postalo je novi i važan zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo automatsku metodu za smanjenje predrasude u pretkivnim jezičkim modelima. Drugačije od prethodnog debijacijskog rada koji koristi vanjsku korporaciju kako bi upravljali pretkišenim modelima, umjesto toga mi direktno probamo predrasude kodirane u pretkišenim modelima kroz brzinu. Posebno, predlažemo variant metode pretraživanja zraka kako bi automatski tražili \\textit{predrasude prompt} tako da su kompleti stila kloza najrazličiti u vezi različitih demografskih grupa. S obzirom na identificirane predrasude, onda predlažemo gubitak poravnanja distribucije kako bi smanjili predrasude. Rezultati eksperimentacija na standardnim setima podataka i metrika pokazuju da naš predloženi pristup \\textbf{Auto-Debias} može značajno smanjiti predrasude, uključujući spol i rasne predrasude, u pretreniranim jezičkim modelima poput BERT, RoBERTa i ALBERT. Osim toga, poboljšanje pravednosti ne smanjuje sposobnosti razumijevanja jezičkih modela, kao što je pokazalo korištenjem referencije GLUE.', 'bn': 'মানুষের মতো বৈষম্য এবং অচিরেই সামাজিক স্টেরিওটাইপ বিশাল ভাষার মডেলে আছে। বাস্তব বিশ্বের অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে এই মডেলগুলোর ব্যাপারে বিস্তারিত গ্রহণ করার ক্ষেত্রে এই ধরনের প্রতিযোগিতার মাত্র এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয় পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে প্রেমিত ভাষার মডেলগুলোকে কমানোর জন্য। পূর্ববর্তী বিভ্রান্ত কাজ থেকে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, যা বাইরের কোর্পোরা ব্যবহার করে প্রেমিক মডেল সুন্দর করে, আমরা সরাসরি প্রমাণ বিশেষ করে, আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অনুসন্ধানের জন্য বীম অনুসন্ধানের একটি ভেয়ারেন্ট প্রস্তাব করছি\\টেক্সটিট {বিভিন্ন গণতান্ত্রিক গ্রুপের প্রতি সম্পর্ক চিহ্নিত বিভিন্ন প্রজাতন্ত্রের কারণে আমরা বিতরণের ক্ষতি প্রস্তাব করি বিভিন্ন বিতরণের ক্ষতি কমানোর জন্য। স্ট্যান্ডার্ডাল ডাটাসেট এবং মেট্রিকেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাব \\টেক্সটবিফ {স্বয়ংক্রিয়-ডেবিয়া} প্রতিযোগিতা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কমিয়ে দ এছাড়াও, ন্যায়বিচারের উন্নতি ভাষার মডেলের বুঝতে পারে না, যেমনটা জিএলউই বেনম্যার্ক ব্যবহার করে দেখা যাচ্ছে।', 'ca': "Els prejudicis humans i els estereotips socials no desitjats existeixen en grans models de llenguatge predireccionats. Tenint en compte l'amplia adopció d'aquests models en aplicacions del món real, mitigar aquests prejudicis s'ha convertit en una tasca emergent i important. En aquest paper, proposem un mètode automàtic per mitigar les tendències dels models de llenguatge preconformats. Diferent de la feina de debització anterior que utilitza corpora externa per a ajustar els models preconseïnats, en canvi investigam directament les biases codificades en models preconseïnats a través de preguntes. Concretament, proposem una variant del mètode de busca al raig per buscar automàticament \\textit{indicacions biased} de manera que les completacions d'estil de cloze siguin les més diferents en relació a diferents grups demogràfics. Tenint en compte les indicacions identificades, proposem una pèrdua d'alliniament de distribució per mitigar les indicacions. Els resultats d'experiments en conjunts de dades i mètriques estandards mostren que el nostre enfocament \\textbf{Auto-Debias} pot reduir significativament els biases, incloent el gènere i el bias racial, en models de llenguatge preconformats com BERT, RoBERTa i ALBERT. A més, la millora de la justetat no redueix les habilitats d'entendre dels models de llenguatge, com s'ha demostrat fent servir el criteri de referència GLUE.", 'cs': 'Lidské zaujatosti a nežádoucí sociální stereotypy existují ve velkých předem trénovaných jazykových modelech. Vzhledem k širokému přijetí těchto modelů v reálných aplikacích se zmírnění těchto předsudků stalo vznikajícím a důležitým úkolem. V tomto článku navrhujeme automatickou metodu zmírnění zaujatostí v předtrénovaných jazykových modelech. Na rozdíl od předchozích debiazovacích prací, které používají externí korpusy k jemnému ladění předtrénovaných modelů, místo toho přímo zkoumáme předběžné zkreslení zakódované v předtrénovaných modelech pomocí výzv. Konkrétně navrhujeme variantu metody vyhledávání paprsků pro automatické vyhledávání \\textit{biased prompts} tak, že dokončení cloze-stylu jsou nejvíce odlišné s ohledem na různé demografické skupiny. Vzhledem k identifikovaným zaujatým výzvám navrhujeme ztrátu zarovnávání distribuce, abychom zmírnili předsudky. Výsledky experimentů na standardních datových sadách a metrikách ukazují, že náš navržený přístup \\textbf{Auto-Debias} může výrazně snížit zaujatosti, včetně genderové a rasové zaujatosti, v předem trénovaných jazykových modelech, jako jsou BERT, RoBERTa a ALBERT. Zlepšení spravedlnosti navíc nesnižuje schopnosti porozumění jazykových modelů, jak je ukázáno pomocí GLUE benchmarku.', 'fi': 'Ihmismäisiä ennakkoluuloja ja ei-toivottuja sosiaalisia stereotypioita esiintyy suurissa esikoulutetuissa kielimalleissa. Kun otetaan huomioon näiden mallien laaja käyttöönotto reaalimaailman sovelluksissa, tällaisten ennakkoluulojen lieventämisestä on tullut nouseva ja tärkeä tehtävä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme automaattista menetelmää esikoulutettujen kielimallien vääristymien lieventämiseksi. Toisin kuin aiemmassa debiasing-työssä, jossa käytetään ulkoisia korpusia esikoulutettujen mallien hienosäätöön, sen sijaan tutkimme suoraan esikoulutettujen mallien koodattuja vikoja kehotteiden avulla. Ehdotamme erityisesti palkkihakemusmenetelmän varianttia, jolla haetaan automaattisesti \\textit{biased prompts} niin, että cloze-tyyliset täydennykset eroavat eniten eri väestöryhmistä. Kun otetaan huomioon tunnistetut harhaanjohtavat kehotukset, ehdotamme sitten jakelun linjauksen menetystä harhaanjohtavien vaikutusten lieventämiseksi. Kokeelliset tulokset vakioaineistoista ja mittareista osoittavat, että ehdotettu \\textbf{Auto-Debias} lähestymistapa voi merkittävästi vähentää ennakkokoulutetuissa kielimalleissa, kuten BERT, RoBERTa ja ALBERT. Oikeudenmukaisuuden parantaminen ei myöskään vähennä kielimallien ymmärtämiskykyä, kuten GLUE-vertailu osoittaa.', 'et': 'Inimlikud eelarvamused ja soovimatud sotsiaalsed stereotüübid eksisteerivad suurtes eelkoolitud keelemudelites. Arvestades nende mudelite laialdast kasutuselevõttu reaalmaailma rakendustes, on selliste eelarvamuste leevendamine muutunud esilekerkivaks ja oluliseks ülesandeks. Käesolevas töös pakume välja automaatse meetodi, mille abil leevendada eeltreenitud keelemudelite kallakuid. Erinevalt varasematest debiaseerimistöödest, kus kasutatakse väliseid korpuseid eeltreenitud mudelite täpsustamiseks, uurime selle asemel otse eeltreenitud mudelites kodeeritud kallakuid viivituste kaudu. Täpsemalt pakume välja kiirte otsingu meetodi variandi, et automaatselt otsida \\textit{kallutatud viibid} nii, et cloze-stiilis täiendused on erinevate demograafiliste rühmade suhtes kõige erinevamad. Arvestades tuvastatud erapooletuid juhiseid, pakume seejärel välja jaotuse vastavuse kaotuse, et leevendada erapooletuid. Standardsete andmekogumite ja mõõdikute katsetulemused näitavad, et meie pakutud \\textbf{Auto-Debias} lähenemisviis võib oluliselt vähendada eelkoolitud keelemudelites nagu BERT, RoBERTa ja ALBERT erapooletusi, sealhulgas soolist ja rassilist erapooletust. Lisaks ei vähenda õigluse parandamine keelemudelite arusaamisvõimet, nagu näidatud GLUE võrdlusaluse kasutamisel.', 'jv': 'Rasane dadi cah-cah sing paling-cah dumadhan karo stereo sing ora luwih dumadhin ngangge model sing luwih basa. Dino nganggo akeh sistem sing dumadhi iki ning aplikasi sing nyimpen iki, iso nggawe biasane iki dadi apik lan akeh lanjut sing mau. Nang pebuk iki, kita supoyo biasane sistem otomatik kanggo mbanjurakan biasane ning model sing luwih apik. Wis CURRENTCURRENT politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness User Nanging, luwih-luwih kanggo ngerasakno kanggo diangkat kuwi tindang model kuwi nggawe sapa-sapa kuwi, kaya ngono nggawe bendhèhan GLUE.', 'ha': 'Kikaci kamar mutum da bakwai masu da bakwai na jami da ba\'a samu\'a cikin misalin harshe mai yawa. Given the wide adoption of these models in real-world applications, mitigating such biases has become an emerging and important task.  Ga wannan takardan, za mu buƙata wata hanyor farat ɗaya dõmin su cire taƙaita cikin misalin harshe da aka baka. Farawa daga aikin da aka riga ya yi amfani da shi na ƙarƙashin firma don ya fito-tune misãlai da aka ƙayyade, ko kuma, za\'a iya jarraba musamman da aka kode shi a cikin misãlai na farko. A ƙayyade, muna goyyade wata dabar-dabar na search metoden boom don ka nema /text tit[prompts] farat ɗaya. Kamar wannan ne, cikakken salon-ƙari masu motsi masu cikin ƙungiyõyi dabam-dabam. Ga da aka gane masu fara-bayan da aka sani, sai za mu buɗa wata hasara ta rabo da juyi zuwa ƙarami ɗin. Matarin jarrabãwa ta ga daidaita danasõn da metrics za\'a nuna cewa buƙatan // littãfin/kwamfyutan-Debiyas") kanasyon hanyoyinmu yana iya ƙarantar da muhimmi ga sauri, kamar misalin harshen da aka ƙayyade, kamar BERT, RoBERTA da AIBERT. Kayya, improven da ãdalci bai ƙara abincin misãlai na harshen, kamar yadda aka nuna da bangon GLUU.', 'sk': 'Človeku podobne pristranskosti in neželeni socialni stereotipi obstajajo v velikih predvadljenih jezikovnih modelih. Glede na široko sprejetje teh modelov v realnih aplikacijah je blažitev takih pristranskosti postala nova in pomembna naloga. V prispevku predlagamo avtomatsko metodo za ublažitev pristranskih jezikovnih modelov. Za razliko od prejšnjih debiasing del, ki uporabljajo zunanje korpuse za natančno nastavitev predtreniranih modelov, namesto tega neposredno preučujemo pristranske, kodirane v predtreniranih modelih, prek pozivov. Natančneje predlagamo različico metode iskanja žarkov za samodejno iskanje \\textit{pristranski pozivi} tako, da so dokončani v slogu cloze najbolj različni glede na različne demografske skupine. Glede na ugotovljene pristranske pozive nato predlagamo izgubo porazdelitve porazdelitve za ublažitev pristranskih pozivov. Rezultati eksperimentov na standardnih naborih podatkov in metrikah kažejo, da lahko naš predlagani pristop \\textbf{Auto-Debias} bistveno zmanjša pristranskost, vključno s spolno in rasno pristranskostjo, v predtreniranih jezikovnih modelih, kot so BERT, RoBERTa in ALBERT. Poleg tega izboljšanje pravičnosti ne zmanjšuje sposobnosti razumevanja jezikovnih modelov, kot je prikazano z uporabo referenčnega merila GLUE.', 'he': "היחידות כמו בני אדם וסטריאוטיפים חברתיים לא מעוניינים קיימות בדוגמנים גדולים של שפה מלפני אימון. בהתחשב באימוץ רחב של הדוגמנים האלה בתוכניות בעולם האמיתי, להקל בהתמחות כאלה הפך למשימה חשובה ומתחררת. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה אוטומטית כדי להקל את ההתמחות בדוגמנים לשפה מלפני אימון. בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת בעבודה של השפלה שמשתמשת בתוכנית חיצונית כדי להתאים את הדוגמנים המתאימים לפני, במקום זה אנו חוקרים ישירות את ההתמחות הקודמות בדוגמנים המתאימים לפני. במיוחד, אנו מציעים שונה של שיטת החיפוש בקרן כדי לחפש באופן אוטומטי \\ textit{ נקודות צדדיות} כך שהשלימות בסגנון הפסקה הן הכי שונות בנוגע לקבוצות דמוגרפיות שונות. בהתחשב בנקודות הזהות, אנו מציעים אובדן התייחסות כדי להקל את הנקודות. Experiment results on standard datasets and metrics show that our proposed \\textbf{Auto-Debias} approach can significantly reduce biases, including gender and racial bias, in pretrained language models such as BERT, RoBERTa and ALBERT.  Moreover, the improvement in fairness does not decrease the language models' understanding abilities, as shown using the GLUE benchmark.", 'bo': "ནི་མིའི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དང་རེ་བ་མེད་པའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྲོལ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཆེ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཡོད། དངོས་གནས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ནང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་འདི་དག་གི་གྲངས་སུ་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་རིམ་གཞན་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག Different from previous debiasing work that uses external corporation to fine-tune the pretrained models. We instead of direct probe the biases encoded in pretrained models through prompts. It's like... དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོས་beam འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་\\\\textit{biased prompts} རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་འདྲ་བྱུང་མི་འདུག ང་ཚོས་འཛིན་བྱས་པ་དང་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་འཆར་འདོན་དགོས་པ་ལྟར། འོན་ཀྱང་ང་ཚོས་བཤད་གྱི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག Experiment results on standard datasets and metrics show that our proposed \\textbf{Auto-Debias} approach can significantly reduce biases, including gender and racial bias, in pretrained language models such as BERT, RoBERTa and ALBERT. ད་དུང་། ཉེན་བདེ་ལྡན་གྱི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་མིག་ཆའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཉེན་བརྟན་པར། དཔེར་ན། GLUE འཆར་བརྟན་"}
{'en': 'WikiDiverse A Multimodal Entity Linking Dataset with Diversified Contextual Topics and Entity Types', 'ar': 'إلى أين تذهب للعطلات: نحو حوارات من النوع المختلط لتوضيح أهداف المستخدم', 'es': 'Dónde ir durante las vacaciones: hacia diálogos de tipo mixto para aclarar los objetivos de los usuarios', 'fr': 'Où aller pendant les fêtes\xa0: vers des boîtes de dialogue mixtes pour clarifier les objectifs des utilisateurs', 'pt': 'Onde ir nas férias: Diálogos de tipo misto para esclarecimento de objetivos do usuário', 'ja': '休日の行き先：ユーザーの目標を明確にするための混合タイプのダイアログに向けて', 'zh': '何往度假:走混合之对话框,以清用户也', 'hi': 'छुट्टियों के लिए कहां जाना है: उपयोगकर्ता लक्ष्यों के स्पष्टीकरण के लिए मिश्रित-प्रकार के संवादों की ओर', 'ru': 'Куда отправиться на каникулы: к диалогам смешанного типа для уточнения целей пользователей', 'ga': 'Cá háit a dtéann na Laethanta Saoire: I dTreo Dialóga de Chineálacha Measctha chun Spriocanna Úsáideora a Shoiléiriú', 'hu': 'Hol menjünk ünnepekre: vegyes típusú párbeszédek felé a felhasználói célok tisztázásához', 'el': 'Πού να πάτε για τις διακοπές: Προς τους διαλόγους μικτού τύπου για τη διευκρίνιση των στόχων του χρήστη', 'ka': 'სად მომხმარებელი მიზეზების განსაზღვრებისთვის გადასვლა: მომხმარებელი მიზეზების განსაზღვრებისთვის გადასვლა', 'it': 'Dove andare per le vacanze: verso dialoghi di tipo misto per chiarire gli obiettivi degli utenti', 'kk': 'Күту күндерін қайда өту: Пайдаланушының мақсаттарын анықтау үшін аралас түрлі диалогтарға', 'lt': 'Kur eiti atostogoms: Mišrių tipų dialogai vartotojo tikslams aiškinti', 'mk': 'Where to Go for the Holidays: Towards Mixed-Type Dialogs for Clarification of User Goals', 'ms': 'Ke mana hendak pergi untuk cuti: Ke arah dialog jenis campuran untuk penjelasan Tujuan Pengguna', 'ml': 'ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഗോളുകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡയലോഗുകള്\u200d മുകളിലേക്കു് കയറുക', 'mt': 'Fejn għandek tmur għall-btajjel: Lejn Djalogi tat-Tip Imħallat għall-Iċċarar tal-Għanijiet tal-Utenti', 'mn': 'Хоёр Байралтын өдрүүд явах вэ? Хэрвээ хэрэглэгчийн зориулалтыг тодорхойлох төрлийн диалогууд руу', 'no': 'Kor for fridagane skal gå: Til mengde type dialogar for å klargjera brukarmål', 'pl': 'Dokąd iść na wakacje: w kierunku dialogów mieszanych w celu wyjaśnienia celów użytkownika', 'ro': 'Unde să mergem în vacanţă: către dialoguri de tip mixt pentru clarificarea obiectivelor utilizatorilor', 'sr': 'Gde da odemo na praznike: prema dijalogima između mišenog tipa za objašnjenje ciljeva korisnika', 'so': 'Halka aad u tegeyso fasaxyada: Towards Mixed-Type Dialogues for Tilmaamin of User Goals', 'si': '@ label: textbox', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis', 'sv': 'Vart man ska åka på semestern: Mot blandade dialoger för klargörande av användarmål', 'ur': 'Holidays کے لئے کہاں جا سکتے ہیں: کارساز مولکوں کی تعریف کے لئے مختلف طریقے کے ڈالیوں کی طرف', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Nơi để đến các ngày lễ: Hướng tới hộp thoại kiểu hỗn hợp để xác định mục tiêu người dùng', 'bg': 'Къде да отидем за празниците: към диалози от смесен тип за изясняване на потребителските цели', 'nl': 'Waar te gaan voor de feestdagen: Naar gemengde dialogen voor verduidelijking van gebruikersdoelen', 'hr': 'Gdje da odemo na praznike: prema dijalogima mješane tipove za objašnjenje ciljeva korisnika', 'da': 'Hvor skal man tage hen på ferien: På vej mod dialoger af blandet type til afklaring af brugermål', 'de': 'Wohin geht es für die Feiertage: Hin zu gemischten Dialogen zur Klärung der Nutzerziele', 'ko': '어디로 휴가를 보내는가: 혼합형 대화상자를 사용하여 사용자의 목표를 밝힌다.', 'fa': 'جایی که برای تعطیلات بروید: به سمت محاورهای نوع مختلف برای تعریف هدف کاربر', 'id': 'Ke mana untuk pergi untuk liburan: Ke dialog jenis campuran untuk menjelaskan tujuan pengguna', 'sw': 'Ni wapi kwenda kwa ajili ya Idara: Dialogu za Mijingo ya Upande wa Kutokana na Utafiti wa Matukio ya Mtumiaji', 'tr': 'Samatlar üçin nirede gitmeli', 'af': 'Waar na Gaan vir die Heilige dage: Gaan na gemengde tipe dialoog vir Klasifikasie van gebruiker doels', 'sq': 'Where to Go for the Holidays: Towards Mixed-Type Dialogs for Clarification of User Goals', 'am': 'ወደ ላይ Mixed-Type Dialogs for Clarification of User Goals', 'az': 'Qullanıcı Göylərini bəyan etmək üçün qarışıqlıq Türü Dialoglarına tərəf', 'hy': 'Որտե՞ղ գնալ արձակուրդի ընթացքում. Որտե՞ղ են օգտագործողի նպատակների պարզաբանելու խառնված տեսակի պատուհանները', 'bn': 'ছুটির জন্য কোথায় যাওয়া: ব্যবহারকারীর গোলের পরিস্কারের জন্য উঠে মিক্সেড- টাইপ ডায়ালগ', 'bs': 'Gdje da odemo na praznike: prema dijalogima mješane tipove za objašnjenje ciljeva korisnika', 'ca': 'On anar per les vacances: cap a diàlegs de tipus mixt per a clarificar els objectius dels usuaris', 'cs': 'Kam jít na dovolenou: směrem k dialogům smíšeného typu pro objasnění uživatelských cílů', 'et': 'Kuhu minna pühadeks: segatüüpi dialoogide suunas kasutaja eesmärkide selgitamiseks', 'fi': 'Minne mennä lomalle: kohti sekamuotoisia dialogeja käyttäjien tavoitteiden selkeyttämiseksi', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'לאן ללכת לחופשות: Towards Mixed-Type Dialogs for Clarification of User Goals', 'sk': 'Kje iti na praznike: k mešanim dialogom za pojasnitev ciljev uporabnikov', 'bo': 'འཇིག་སྣོད་ལ་སྐྱོད་དགོས་པ་དུས། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ལ་གྲོས་ཁྱེར་བྱ་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Multimodal Entity Linking MEL which aims at linking mentions with multimodal contexts to the referent entities from a knowledge base e.g. Wikipedia is an essential task for many multimodal applications Although much attention has been paid to MEL the shortcomings of existing MEL datasets including limited contextual topics and entity types simplified mention ambiguity and restricted availability have caused great obstacles to the research and application of MEL In this paper we present WikiDiverse a high quality human annotated MEL dataset with diversified contextual topics and entity types from Wikinews which uses Wikipedia as the corresponding knowledge base A well tailored annotation procedure is adopted to ensure the quality of the dataset Based on WikiDiverse a sequence of well designed MEL models with intra modality and inter modality attentions are implemented which utilize the visual information of images more adequately than existing MEL models do Extensive experimental analyses are conducted to investigate the contributions of different modalities in terms of MEL facilitating the future research on this task', 'fr': "La plupart des systèmes de dialogue affirment que les utilisateurs ont défini des objectifs clairs et précis avant de commencer une interaction. Par exemple, les utilisateurs ont déterminé le départ, la destination et la durée du trajet pour réserver un vol. Cependant, dans de nombreux scénarios, limités par l'expérience et les connaissances, les utilisateurs peuvent savoir ce dont ils ont besoin, mais ont encore du mal à déterminer des objectifs clairs et spécifiques en déterminant tous les créneaux nécessaires. \n\nDans cet article, nous identifierons ce défi et ferons un pas en avant en recueillant un nouveau corpus de dialogue de type mixte interhumain. Il contient 5 000 sessions de dialogue et 168 000 énoncés pour 4 types de boîtes de dialogue et 5 domaines. Au cours de chaque session, un agent fournit d'abord des connaissances liées aux objectifs de l'utilisateur afin de déterminer des objectifs clairs et spécifiques, puis de les atteindre. \n\nDe plus, nous proposons un modèle de dialogue de type mixte avec un nouveau mécanisme d'apprentissage continu basé sur des invites. Plus précisément, le mécanisme permet au modèle de renforcer continuellement sa capacité sur n'importe quel type spécifique en utilisant efficacement les corpus de dialogue existants.", 'pt': 'A maioria dos sistemas de diálogo postula que os usuários descobriram objetivos claros e específicos antes de iniciar uma interação. Por exemplo, os usuários determinaram a partida, o destino e o tempo de viagem para reservar um voo. No entanto, em muitos cenários, limitados pela experiência e conhecimento, os usuários podem saber o que precisam, mas ainda lutam para descobrir objetivos claros e específicos, determinando todos os slots necessários.\n\nNeste artigo, identificamos esse desafio e damos um passo à frente coletando um novo corpus de diálogo de tipo misto humano para humano. Ele contém 5k sessões de diálogo e 168k enunciados para 4 tipos de diálogo e 5 domínios. Em cada sessão, um agente primeiro fornece conhecimento relacionado aos objetivos do usuário para ajudar a descobrir objetivos claros e específicos e, em seguida, ajudar a alcançá-los.\n\nAlém disso, propomos um modelo de diálogo do tipo misto com um novo mecanismo de aprendizado contínuo baseado em prompt. Especificamente, o mecanismo permite que o modelo fortaleça continuamente sua capacidade em qualquer tipo específico, utilizando efetivamente os corpos de diálogo existentes.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los sistemas de diálogo postulan que los usuarios han establecido objetivos claros y específicos antes de iniciar una interacción. Por ejemplo, los usuarios han determinado la salida, el destino y el tiempo de viaje para reservar un vuelo. Sin embargo, en muchos escenarios, limitados por la experiencia y el conocimiento, los usuarios pueden saber lo que necesitan, pero aún así tienen dificultades para encontrar objetivos claros y específicos mediante la determinación de todos los espacios necesarios. \n\nEn este artículo, identificamos este desafío y damos un paso adelante al recopilar un nuevo corpus de diálogo de tipo mixto de persona a persona. Contiene 5000 sesiones de diálogo y 168 000 enunciados para 4 tipos de diálogo y 5 dominios. En cada sesión, un agente primero proporciona conocimientos relacionados con los objetivos del usuario para ayudar a determinar objetivos claros y específicos, y luego ayudar a alcanzarlos. \n\nAdemás, proponemos un modelo de diálogo de tipo mixto con un novedoso mecanismo de aprendizaje continuo basado en Prompt. Específicamente, el mecanismo permite que el modelo fortalezca continuamente su capacidad en cualquier tipo específico mediante la utilización efectiva de los cuerpos de diálogo existentes.', 'ar': 'تفترض معظم أنظمة الحوار أن المستخدمين قد توصلوا إلى أهداف واضحة ومحددة قبل بدء التفاعل. على سبيل المثال ، حدد المستخدمون المغادرة والوجهة ووقت السفر لحجز الرحلة. ومع ذلك ، في العديد من السيناريوهات ، المقيدة بالخبرة والمعرفة ، قد يعرف المستخدمون ما يحتاجون إليه ، لكنهم ما زالوا يكافحون لمعرفة أهداف واضحة ومحددة من خلال تحديد جميع الخانات الضرورية.\n\nفي هذه الورقة ، نحدد هذا التحدي ، ونتقدم خطوة للأمام من خلال تجميع مجموعة حوار مختلط النوع جديد من إنسان إلى إنسان. يحتوي على جلسات حوار 5 كيلو و 168 ألف كلام لأربعة أنواع حوار و 5 مجالات. في كل جلسة ، يوفر الوكيل أولاً المعرفة المتعلقة بأهداف المستخدم للمساعدة في تحديد أهداف واضحة ومحددة ، ثم المساعدة في تحقيقها.\n\nعلاوة على ذلك ، نقترح نموذج حوار من النوع المختلط بآلية جديدة للتعلم المستمر تعتمد على الفوري. على وجه التحديد ، تمكن الآلية النموذج من تعزيز قدرته باستمرار على أي نوع معين من خلال الاستفادة من مجموعات الحوار الحالية بشكل فعال.', 'ja': 'ほとんどのダイアログシステムは、ユーザーがインタラクションを開始する前に明確で具体的な目標を把握していることを前提としています。 例えば、ユーザは、フライトを予約するための出発地、目的地、及び移動時間を決定した。  しかし、経験と知識に制限された多くのシナリオでは、ユーザーは必要なものを知っているかもしれませんが、すべての必要なスロットを決定することによって明確で具体的な目標を見つけるのに苦労します。 \n\n本稿では、この課題を特定し、新たな人間と人間の混合型ダイアログコーパスを収集することで、一歩前進する。 これには、4つのダイアログタイプと5つのドメインの5 kダイアログセッションと168 k発話が含まれています。 各セッションでは、エージェントはまずユーザー目標に関連する知識を提供し、明確で具体的な目標を特定し、それを達成するのに役立ちます。 \n\nさらに、新しいPromptベースの継続的学習メカニズムを備えた混合型ダイアログモデルを提案する。 具体的には、このメカニズムは、モデルが既存のダイアログ体を効果的に利用することによって、任意の特定のタイプに対する能力を継続的に強化することを可能にする。', 'hi': 'अधिकांश संवाद प्रणालियों का मानना है कि उपयोगकर्ताओं ने इंटरैक्शन शुरू करने से पहले स्पष्ट और विशिष्ट लक्ष्यों का पता लगाया है। उदाहरण के लिए, उपयोगकर्ताओं ने उड़ान बुक करने के लिए प्रस्थान, गंतव्य और यात्रा का समय निर्धारित किया है।  हालांकि, कई परिदृश्यों में, अनुभव और ज्ञान द्वारा सीमित, उपयोगकर्ताओं को पता चल सकता है कि उन्हें क्या चाहिए, लेकिन फिर भी सभी आवश्यक स्लॉट निर्धारित करके स्पष्ट और विशिष्ट लक्ष्यों का पता लगाने के लिए संघर्ष करें। \n\nइस पेपर में, हम इस चुनौती की पहचान करते हैं, और एक नए मानव-से-मानव मिश्रित-प्रकार के संवाद कॉर्पस को इकट्ठा करके एक कदम आगे बढ़ाते हैं। इसमें 5k संवाद सत्र और 4 संवाद प्रकार और 5 डोमेन के लिए 168k कथन शामिल हैं। प्रत्येक सत्र के भीतर, एक एजेंट पहले स्पष्ट और विशिष्ट लक्ष्यों का पता लगाने में मदद करने के लिए उपयोगकर्ता-लक्ष्य से संबंधित ज्ञान प्रदान करता है, और फिर उन्हें प्राप्त करने में मदद करता है। \n\nइसके अलावा, हम एक उपन्यास प्रॉम्प्ट-आधारित निरंतर सीखने के तंत्र के साथ एक मिश्रित-प्रकार के संवाद मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, तंत्र मॉडल को मौजूदा संवाद कॉर्पोरेट का प्रभावी ढंग से उपयोग करके किसी भी विशिष्ट प्रकार पर अपनी क्षमता को लगातार मजबूत करने में सक्षम बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Большинство диалоговых систем утверждают, что пользователи определили четкие и конкретные цели перед началом взаимодействия. Например, пользователи определили вылет, пункт назначения и время в пути для бронирования рейса.  Тем не менее, во многих сценариях, ограниченных опытом и знаниями, пользователи могут знать, что им нужно, но все же им трудно понять четкие и конкретные цели, определив все необходимые слоты. \n\nВ этой работе мы выявляем эту проблему и делаем шаг вперед, собирая новое тело диалога между людьми смешанного типа. Содержит 5k диалоговых сеансов и 168k высказываний для 4 типов диалогов и 5 доменов. В течение каждого сеанса агент сначала предоставляет знания, связанные с целями пользователя, чтобы помочь определить четкие и конкретные цели, а затем помочь их достичь. \n\nКроме того, мы предлагаем модель диалога смешанного типа с новым механизмом непрерывного обучения, основанным на подсказках. В частности, этот механизм позволяет модели постоянно повышать свою способность к любому конкретному типу путем эффективного использования существующих диалоговых корпусов.', 'zh': '大抵言统假设用户先交已定。 如用户已定预订航班出发地、目行日月。  然而众情之制,用户知其所须,而难定其插槽以明之也。 \n\n本文中,定此挑战,因收新人与人混合型语料库进一步。 含 5k 对话会言 168k 语,宜于 4 种 5 个域。 凡会话,摄先关用户,以定其明,然后成之。 \n\n此外立一混合型对法。 机者,所以效用也语料库来所以益特定也。', 'ga': "Dearbhaíonn an chuid is mó de na córais dialóige go bhfuil spriocanna soiléire agus sonracha aimsithe ag úsáideoirí sula dtosaíonn siad ar idirghníomhaíocht. Mar shampla, tá an imeacht, an ceann scríbe agus an t-am taistil chun eitilt a chur in áirithe socraithe ag úsáideoirí. Mar sin féin, i go leor cásanna, teoranta ag taithí agus eolas, d'fhéadfadh go mbeadh a fhios ag úsáideoirí cad a theastaíonn uathu, ach fós go mbeidh sé deacair acu spriocanna soiléire agus sonracha a dhéanamh amach trí na sliotáin riachtanacha go léir a chinneadh.\n\nSa pháipéar seo, sainaithnímid an dúshlán seo, agus déanaimid céim chun cinn trí chorpas nua dialóige de chineál measctha duine go duine a bhailiú. Tá seisiúin dialóige 5k agus 168k caint ann do 4 chineál dialóige agus 5 fhearann. Laistigh de gach seisiún, cuireann gníomhaire eolas a bhaineann le húsáideoirí ar fáil ar dtús chun cabhrú le spriocanna soiléire agus sonracha a aimsiú, agus ansin cuidiú leo iad a bhaint amach.\n\nIna theannta sin, molaimid samhail dialóige de chineál measctha le meicníocht nuálach foghlama leanúnaí Pras-bhunaithe. Go sonrach, cuireann an mheicníocht ar chumas an mhúnla a chumas a neartú go leanúnach ar aon chineál ar leith trí úsáid éifeachtach a bhaint as corpora dialóige atá ann cheana féin.", 'hu': 'A legtöbb párbeszédrendszer azt állítja, hogy a felhasználók egyértelmű és konkrét célokat találtak ki az interakció megkezdése előtt. A felhasználók például meghatározták a járat foglalásának indulását, úti célját és utazási idejét. A tapasztalat és a tudás által korlátozott számos forgatókönyvben azonban a felhasználók tudhatják, mire van szükségük, de még mindig küzdenek a világos és konkrét célok kitalálásával az összes szükséges résidő meghatározásával.', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სისტემების უფრო დიალოგის სისტემები, რომ მომხმარებელი განსაკუთრებული და განსაკუთრებული მიზეზები შეიძლება ინტერფექციის დაწყება მაგალითად, მომხმარებელი განსაზღვრებულია გადასვლა, მისაღები და მოგზავრების დრო, რომელიც გადასვლა. მაგრამ, ბევრი სინარიოში, გამოცდილებით და მეცნიერებით, მომხმარებელი შეიძლება იცით რა უნდა იყოს, მაგრამ ისინი უნდა იცოდეს, მაგრამ ისინი უნდა იყოს წარმოადგილი და განსაკუთრე', 'it': "La maggior parte dei sistemi di dialogo ipotizza che gli utenti abbiano capito obiettivi chiari e specifici prima di iniziare un'interazione. Ad esempio, gli utenti hanno determinato la partenza, la destinazione e l'orario di viaggio per la prenotazione di un volo. Tuttavia, in molti scenari, limitati da esperienza e conoscenza, gli utenti possono sapere di cosa hanno bisogno, ma ancora faticano a capire obiettivi chiari e specifici determinando tutte le slot necessarie.", 'kk': 'Интерфейсі бастау алдында пайдаланушылардың көпшілігі таза мен нақты мақсаттарды табылған деп белгіледі. Мысалы, пайдаланушылар ұшақ сақтау үшін шығыс, мақсат және саяхаттың уақытын анықталды. Бірақ көптеген сценарияларда, тәжірибе мен білім бойынша шектелген, пайдаланушылар олардың қажетті нәрсені біледі, бірақ әлі қажетті лоттарды анықтап таңдау үшін таңдау мен нақты ма', 'el': 'Τα περισσότερα συστήματα διαλόγου υποστηρίζουν ότι οι χρήστες έχουν υπολογίσει σαφείς και συγκεκριμένους στόχους πριν ξεκινήσουν μια αλληλεπίδραση. Για παράδειγμα, οι χρήστες έχουν καθορίσει την αναχώρηση, τον προορισμό και την ώρα ταξιδιού για την κράτηση μιας πτήσης. Ωστόσο, σε πολλά σενάρια, περιορισμένα από την εμπειρία και τη γνώση, οι χρήστες μπορεί να γνωρίζουν τι χρειάζονται, αλλά εξακολουθούν να αγωνίζονται να βρουν σαφείς και συγκεκριμένους στόχους καθορίζοντας όλες τις απαραίτητες κουλοχέρηδες.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan sistem dialog menganggap pengguna telah mengetahui tujuan yang jelas dan spesifik sebelum memulakan interaksi. Contohnya, pengguna telah menentukan tempat keluar, destinasi, dan masa perjalanan untuk memesan penerbangan. Namun, dalam banyak skenario, terbatas oleh pengalaman dan pengetahuan, pengguna mungkin tahu apa yang mereka perlukan, tetapi masih berjuang untuk mencari tujuan jelas dan spesifik dengan menentukan semua slot yang diperlukan.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ഇടപാട് തുടങ്ങുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള ഗോളുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയിട്ടുണ ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d വിമാനം ബുക്ക് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d തീരുമാനിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും, അനുഭവങ്ങളും അറിവുമായി പരിധിയുള്ള പലതും കാഴ്ചകളില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d അറിയാം അവര്\u200dക്ക് എന്താണ് ആവശ്യമുള്ളതെന്ന്, പക്ഷെ ഇപ്പോഴും വ്യക്തമ', 'mn': 'Ихэнх диалог системүүд хэрэглэгчид харилцааны эхлэхээс өмнө тодорхой, тодорхой зорилго олж мэдсэн гэдгийг ойлгож байна. Жишээлбэл, хэрэглэгчид нисэх зам, зам, аялах цаг шийдсэн. Гэхдээ олон тохиолдолд хэрэглэгчид юу хэрэгтэй вэ гэдгийг мэдэх боломжтой болно. Гэхдээ хэрэглэгчид хэрэгтэй зүйлсийг тодорхой, тодорхой зорилгоонуудыг тодорхойлж чаддаг.', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tas-sistemi ta’ djalogu jippożizzjoniw li l-utenti identifikaw għanijiet ċari u speċifiċi qabel ma bdew interazzjoni. Pereżempju, l-utenti ddeterminaw it-tluq, id-destinazzjoni, u l-ħin tal-ivvjaġġar għall-prenotazzjoni ta’ titjira. Madankollu, f’ħafna xenarji, limitati mill-esperjenza u l-għarfien, l-utenti jistgħu jkunu jafu x’jeħtieġu, iżda xorta waħda qed ibatu biex isibu għanijiet ċari u speċifiċi billi jiddeterminaw is-slots kollha meħtieġa.', 'mk': 'Повеќето дијалошки системи поставуваат дека корисниците откриле јасни и специфични цели пред да започнат интеракција. На пример, корисниците го одредија заминувањето, дестинацијата и времето на патување за резервирање на летот. However, in many scenarios, limited by experience and knowledge, users may know what they need, but still struggle to figure out clear and specific goals by determining all the necessary slots.', 'lt': 'Dauguma dialogo sistemų teigia, kad prieš pradedant sąveiką naudotojai nustatė aiškius ir konkrečius tikslus. For example, users have determined the departure, the destination, and the travel time for booking a flight.   However, in many scenarios, limited by experience and knowledge, users may know what they need, but still struggle to figure out clear and specific goals by determining all the necessary slots.', 'pl': 'Większość systemów dialogowych zakłada, że użytkownicy ustalili jasne i konkretne cele przed rozpoczęciem interakcji. Na przykład użytkownicy określili odlot, miejsce docelowe i czas podróży do rezerwacji lotu. Jednak w wielu scenariuszach, ograniczonych doświadczeniem i wiedzą, użytkownicy mogą wiedzieć, czego potrzebują, ale wciąż mają trudności z ustaleniem jasnych i konkretnych celów poprzez określenie wszystkich niezbędnych slotów.', 'no': 'Dei fleste dialogsystema plasserer at brukarar har finna ut klare og spesifikke mål før ein interaksjon startar. For eksempel har brukarar bestemt avslutninga, målet og reistidstida for å boksera eit flyt. Men i mange scenarioar, begrenset av erfaring og kunnskap, kan brukarar vite kva dei treng, men fortsatt strømmer for å finna ut klare og spesifikke mål ved å bestemme alle nødvendige plassane.', 'ro': 'Majoritatea sistemelor de dialog presupun că utilizatorii și-au dat seama de obiective clare și specifice înainte de a începe o interacțiune. De exemplu, utilizatorii au determinat plecarea, destinația și timpul de călătorie pentru rezervarea unui zbor. Cu toate acestea, în multe scenarii, limitate de experiență și cunoștințe, utilizatorii pot ști de ce au nevoie, dar totuși se luptă să-și dea seama de obiective clare și specifice prin determinarea tuturor sloturilor necesare.', 'so': "Isticmaalayaasha badankoodu waxay leeyihiin in isticmaalayaashu ay sawireen goal cad oo gaar ah ka hor inta aan bilaaban interfeysi. Tusaale ahaan isticmaalayaashu waxay go’aanka, goobtaada, iyo waqtiga safarka ee boosaska safarka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay isticmaalayaashu ogaan karaan waxa ay u baahan yihiin, laakiin weli waxay u dagaalamayaan inay ogaato goal cad oo gaar ah si ay u go'aan dhamaan meelaha loo baahan yahay.", 'sv': 'De flesta dialogsystem utgår från att användarna har listat ut tydliga och specifika mål innan en interaktion påbörjas. Användarna har till exempel bestämt avgång, destination och restid för att boka ett flyg. Men i många scenarier, begränsade av erfarenhet och kunskap, kan användare veta vad de behöver, men ändå kämpa för att komma fram tydliga och specifika mål genom att bestämma alla nödvändiga slots.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් සංවාදය පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ පැහැදිලි සහ විශේෂ අරමුණු හොයාගත්තා කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජ උදාහරණයෙන්, ප්\u200dරයාගකයෝ ප්\u200dරයාගකයෝ ප්\u200dරයාගකයෙන් ගිහින් යන්න, අවස්ථානය, සහ ප්\u200dරයාගයක් ප්\u200dරය නමුත්, ගොඩක් සීනාරියෝ, අභිවේදය සහ දන්නයෙන් සීමාවිත වෙලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් ඔවුන්ට ඕනේ දේවල් දැනගන්න, ඒත් තවමත් පැ', 'ur': 'اکثر ڈالیلوگ سیسٹم مضبوط ہوتے ہیں کہ کارساز ایک تعامل شروع کرنے سے پہلے صریح اور خاص موجودات کو معلوم کر چکے ہیں. مثال یہ ہے کہ کارساز نے اٹھانے والی جگہ اور سفر کا وقت مقرر کیا ہے However, in many scenarios, limited by experience and knowledge, users may know what they need, but still struggle to figure out clear and specific goals by determining all necessary slots.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான உரையாடல் அமைப்புகள் கொண்டிருக்கிறது பயனர் ஒரு இடைவெளி துவங்குவதற்கு முன் தெளிவாக மற்றும் குற உதாரணமாக, பயனர்கள் விமானம் புகுபதிக்க வெளியேறுதல், சேருமிடத்தையும், மற்றும் பயணம் நேரமைத் தீர்மானித்து ஆயினும், பல காட்சிகளில், அனுபவம் மற்றும் அறிவு மூலம் வரையறுக்கப்பட்டு, பயனர்கள் அவர்களுக்கு என்ன தேவைப்படுகிறது என்பதை அறியலாம், ஆனால் இன்னும் த', 'sr': 'Većina dijalogskih sistema pozicija da su korisnici otkrili jasne i specifične ciljeve prije početka interakcije. Na primer, korisnici su odredili odlazak, destinaciju i putovanje vremena za rezervaciju leta. Međutim, u mnogim scenarijama, ograničenim iskustvom i znanjem, korisnici mogu znati šta im je potrebno, ali se i dalje bore za shvatiti jasne i specifične ciljeve odlučujući sve potrebne mesta.', 'uz': "Koʻpchilik muloqat tizimi interfeys boshlashdan oldin foydalanuvchilar toʻgʻri va maxsus maqolani aniqlaydi. Masalan, foydalanuvchilar birga chiqishni, mahallikni, sayohat olish uchun safar vaqtni tayyorlaydi. . Lekin ko'pchilik tajriba va ta'rif bilan chegara bo'lgan foydalanuvchilar nima kerakligini bilishi mumkin, lekin hamma kerakli jadvallarni aniqlashga harakat qiladi.", 'vi': 'Hầu hết hệ thống hộp thoại khẳng định người dùng đã tìm ra mục tiêu rõ ràng và cụ thể trước khi bắt đầu giao tiếp. Ví dụ, người dùng đã xác định sự khởi hành, đích đến và thời gian để đặt một chuyến bay. Tuy nhiên, trong nhiều viễn cảnh, hạn chế bởi kinh nghiệm và kiến thức, người dùng có thể biết mình cần gì, nhưng vẫn cố gắng để tìm ra mục tiêu rõ ràng và cụ thể bằng cách quyết định các khe hở cần thiết.', 'bg': 'Повечето диалогови системи предполагат, че потребителите са установили ясни и конкретни цели, преди да започнат взаимодействие. Например потребителите са определили заминаването, дестинацията и времето за пътуване за резервиране на полет. Въпреки това, в много сценарии, ограничени от опит и знания, потребителите могат да знаят от какво се нуждаят, но все пак се борят да намерят ясни и конкретни цели, като определят всички необходими слотове.', 'hr': 'Većina dijalogskih sustava poziraju da su korisnici otkrili jasne i specifične ciljeve prije početka interakcije. Na primjer, korisnici su odredili odlazak, odredište i vrijeme putovanja za rezervaciju leta. Međutim, u mnogim scenarijama, ograničenim iskustvom i znanjem, korisnici mogu znati što im je potrebno, ali se i dalje bore za shvatiti jasne i specifične ciljeve odlučujući sve potrebne mjesta.', 'da': 'De fleste dialogsystemer forestiller, at brugerne har fundet klare og specifikke mål, før de starter en interaktion. Brugerne har f.eks. bestemt afgangen, destinationen og rejsetiden for reservation af et fly. Men i mange scenarier, begrænset af erfaring og viden, kan brugerne måske vide, hvad de har brug for, men stadig kæmper for at finde klare og specifikke mål ved at fastlægge alle de nødvendige slots.', 'nl': "De meeste dialoogsystemen gaan ervan uit dat gebruikers duidelijke en specifieke doelen hebben bedacht voordat ze een interactie beginnen. Gebruikers hebben bijvoorbeeld het vertrek, de bestemming en de reistijd voor het boeken van een vlucht bepaald. Echter, in veel scenario's, beperkt door ervaring en kennis, kunnen gebruikers weten wat ze nodig hebben, maar nog steeds moeite hebben om duidelijke en specifieke doelen te bepalen door alle benodigde slots te bepalen.", 'de': 'Die meisten Dialogsysteme gehen davon aus, dass Benutzer klare und spezifische Ziele festgelegt haben, bevor sie eine Interaktion beginnen. So haben Nutzer beispielsweise den Abflug, das Ziel und die Reisezeit für die Buchung eines Fluges festgelegt. In vielen Szenarien, die durch Erfahrung und Wissen begrenzt sind, können Benutzer jedoch wissen, was sie brauchen, aber immer noch Schwierigkeiten haben, klare und spezifische Ziele zu finden, indem sie alle erforderlichen Slots festlegen.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan sistem dialog berposisi bahwa pengguna telah menemukan tujuan jelas dan spesifik sebelum memulai interaksi. Contohnya, pengguna telah menentukan perjalanan, tujuan, dan waktu perjalanan untuk memesan penerbangan. Namun, dalam banyak skenario, terbatas oleh pengalaman dan pengetahuan, pengguna mungkin tahu apa yang mereka butuhkan, tapi masih berjuang untuk mencari tujuan jelas dan spesifik dengan menentukan semua slot yang diperlukan.', 'ko': '대부분의 대화 시스템은 사용자가 상호작용을 시작하기 전에 명확한 목표를 정했다고 가정한다.예를 들어 사용자는 이미 항공편의 출발지, 목적지, 여행 시간을 확정했다.그러나 많은 장면에서 경험과 지식의 제한으로 인해 사용자는 그들이 무엇을 필요로 하는지 알 수 있지만 필요한 모든 시기를 확정함으로써 명확하고 구체적인 목표를 정하기는 어렵다.', 'sw': 'Mifumo mingi ya mazungumzo yanamiliki kuwa watumiaji wamegundua malengo wazi na mahsusi kabla ya kuanza mazungumzo. Kwa mfano, watumiaji wameamua kuondoka, mahali pengine, na muda wa safari ili kuandika ndege. . ... Hata hivyo, katika hali mbalimbali, wenye uzoefu na maarifa, watumiaji wanaweza kujua kile wanachokihitaji, lakini bado wanajitahidi kutambua malengo ya wazi na maalum kwa kuamua matokeo yote yanayohitajika.', 'tr': 'Ullançylaryň köp dialoog sistemleri etkileşim başlamadan öň belli we belli maksadlary çözdiklerini bilýärler. Mesela, ulananlar uçuş baglamak üçin gitmegi, maksady we syýahat wagtyny bejerdiler. Ýöne köp senaryýada, tecrübe we bilim bilen mugalan, ullançylaryň näme gerekdigini bilýändigini bilýändigini bilýän bolup bilýärler, ýöne henizem gerekli ýerleri tanamak üçin açık we belli maksadlary çözmek üçin mücadele edýärler.', 'af': "Die meeste dialoog stelsels posisie dat gebruikers duidelik en spesifieke doels voor 'n interaksie begin het. Byvoorbeeld, het gebruikers die afwyking, die bestemming en die reis tyd bepaal om 'n vlieg te boek. Maar in baie scenarios, beperk deur erfaring en kennis, kan gebruikers weet wat hulle nodig het, maar steeds struikel om duidelik en spesifieke doels te vind deur al die nodige plekke te bepaal.", 'am': 'ብዙ ጥያቄ ሲስተም በተጠቃሚ ተቃውሞ ከመጀመር በፊት የተለየ እና የተለየ አቃላቢ መስኮቶችን አግኝተዋል፡፡ ለምሳሌ፥ ተጠቃሚዎች መሄዱንና ማደሪያውን፥ የጉዞውን ጉዞ ለመስጠት ጊዜ ቆርጠዋል። ነገር ግን በብዙ ስዕይታዎች፣ እውቀት እና እውቀት የተደረገ፣ ተጠቃሚዎች የሚያስፈልጉትን እንዲያውቁ ይችላሉ፤ ነገር ግን ገና የሚያስፈልገውን ስርዓት ሁሉ በማረጋገጥ ይታገላሉ፡፡', 'sq': 'Shumica e sistemeve të dialogut vendosin se përdoruesit kanë kuptuar qëllime të qarta dhe specifike para se të fillojnë një ndërveprim. Për shembull, përdoruesit kanë përcaktuar daljen, destinacionin dhe kohën e udhëtimit për të rezervuar një fluturim. Megjithatë, në shumë skenarë, të kufizuar nga përvoja dhe njohuria, përdoruesit mund të dinë se çfarë kanë nevojë, por ende luftojnë për të gjetur qëllime të qarta dhe të posaçme duke përcaktuar të gjitha kohët e nevojshme.', 'hy': 'Most dialog systems posit that users have figured out clear and specific goals before starting an interaction.  Օրինակ, օգտագործողները որոշել են թռիչքի պահելու համար ճանապարհորդության հեռավորությունը, նպատակը և ժամանակը: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ սցենարներում, սահմանափակված փորձով և գիտելիքով, օգտագործողները կարող են իմանալ, թե ինչի կարիք ունեն, բայց դեռևս պայքարում են հասկանալ պարզ և հատուկ նպատակներ, որոշելով բոլոր անհրաժեշտ վա', 'bn': 'Most dialog systems posit that users have figured out clear and specific goals before starting an interaction.  উদাহরণস্বরূপ, ব্যবহারকারীরা বিমান, গন্তব্য এবং ফ্লাইট বুক করার জন্য যাত্রার সময় নির্ধারণ করেছে। তবে অনেক দৃশ্যের মধ্যে, অভিজ্ঞতা এবং জ্ঞানের মাধ্যমে সীমিত, ব্যবহারকারীরা জানতে পারে তাদের কি দরকার, কিন্তু এখনো পরিষ্কার এবং নির্দিষ', 'az': 'İşləşmə başlamadan əvvəl istifadəçilərin açıq və müəyyən məqsədlərini çəkdiklərini bildirirlər. Misal olaraq, istifadəçilər bir uçuş yazmaq üçün çıxmaq, məskəni və səfərə zamanı müəyyən etdilər. Ancaq çoxlu scenariolərdə, təcrübə və bilgi ilə sınırlı, istifadəçilərin nəyə ihtiyacı olduğunu bilirlər, amma hələ də açıq və müəyyən nişanları çəkmək üçün mübahisə edirlər.', 'bs': 'Većina dijalogskih sustava poziraju da su korisnici otkrili jasne i specifične ciljeve prije početka interakcije. Na primjer, korisnici su odredili odlazak, destinaciju i vrijeme putovanja za rezervaciju leta. Međutim, u mnogim scenarijama, ograničenim iskustvom i znanjem, korisnici mogu znati što im je potrebno, ali se i dalje bore za shvatiti jasne i specifične ciljeve odlučujući sve potrebne mjesta.', 'fa': 'بیشتر سیستم\u200cهای محاورۀ محاورۀ مشخص می\u200cکنند که کاربران قبل از شروع یک تعامل هدف\u200cهای واضح و خاص را پیدا کردند. برای مثال، کاربران برگشت، موقعیت و زمان سفر برای برگشت پرواز تعیین کردند. ولی در بسیاری از سناریوها، محدود به تجربه و دانش، کاربران ممکن است بدانند که چه نیاز دارند، ولی هنوز برای فهمیدن هدف\u200cهای روشن و خاص با تعیین تمام محل\u200cهای لازم جهاد می\u200cکنند.', 'cs': 'Většina dialogových systémů předpokládá, že uživatelé si před zahájením interakce vymysleli jasné a konkrétní cíle. Uživatelé například určili odlet, cíl a dobu cesty pro rezervaci letu. Nicméně v mnoha scénářích, omezených zkušenostmi a znalostmi, uživatelé mohou vědět, co potřebují, ale stále se snaží zjistit jasné a konkrétní cíle stanovením všech potřebných slotů.', 'ca': "La majoria dels sistemes de diàleg diuen que els usuaris han descobert objectius clars i específics abans de començar una interacció. Per exemple, els usuaris han determinat la partida, el destin i el temps de viatge per reservar un vol. Però en molts escenaris, limitats per l'experiència i el coneixement, els usuaris poden saber què necessiten, però encara lluiten per entendre objectius clars i específics determinant tots els slots necessaris.", 'et': 'Enamik dialoogisüsteeme eeldab, et kasutajad on enne suhtluse alustamist selged ja konkreetsed eesmärgid välja mõelnud. Näiteks on kasutajad määranud lennu broneerimiseks väljumise, sihtkoha ja reisiaja. Paljudes kogemuste ja teadmiste piiratud stsenaariumides võivad kasutajad siiski teada, mida nad vajavad, kuid siiski vaevavad selgete ja konkreetsete eesmärkide väljatöötamisega, määrates kindlaks kõik vajalikud teenindusajad.', 'fi': 'Useimmat dialogijärjestelmät olettavat, että käyttäjät ovat selvittäneet selkeät ja tarkat tavoitteet ennen vuorovaikutuksen aloittamista. Käyttäjät ovat esimerkiksi määrittäneet lennon varaamisen lähtö-, kohde- ja matkustusajan. Kuitenkin monissa tilanteissa, joita kokemus ja tieto rajoittavat, käyttäjät voivat tietää, mitä he tarvitsevat, mutta silti kamppailevat selkeiden ja täsmällisten tavoitteiden määrittämisessä määrittämällä kaikki tarvittavat lähtö- ja saapumisajat.', 'jv': 'dialog-box-mode Sampeyan, baduh, gunakake dipoleh kanggo ngilangno, galaksi lan mbumbutuhak sandi kanggo ngilangno njujug. Nanging ketahana-ketahan, akeh lan alam-akeh liyane, iso nggawe ngerti apa ora ono sing kudu nggawe, kepengin nyong ngomong njaluké awak dhéwé uga beraksi supoyo awak dhéwé kanggo lembah awak dhéwé.', 'ha': 'Babu yawa na zauren akwatin bayanin zauren akwatin bayani na zasu sami da amfani da suka nuna goal masu buƙata da ƙayyade gaba ga fara wani interaction. Misali, masu amfani da shi sun ƙaddara tafiyar da matsayi, da lokaci na safari wa bookiyar safari. Haƙĩƙa, a cikin masu yawa, ana ƙayyade da abinci da ilmi, masu amfani sai su san abin da ake amfani da su, kuma amma yana ƙari yin jihãdi dõmin ya san goayin bayani da ƙayyadadde duk misãlai da ake ƙayyade.', 'he': 'רוב מערכות דיאלוגים מצביעות שמשתמשים הבינו מטרות ברורות ומספציפיות לפני שהתחילו אינטראקציה. לדוגמה, משתמשים קבעו את הנסיעה, את היעד, ואת זמן הנסיעה להזמין טיסה. However, in many scenarios, limited by experience and knowledge, users may know what they need, but still struggle to figure out clear and specific goals by determining all the necessary slots.', 'sk': 'Večina pogovornih sistemov navaja, da so uporabniki pred začetkom interakcije ugotovili jasne in specifične cilje. Uporabniki so na primer določili odhod, cilj in čas potovanja za rezervacijo leta. Vendar pa lahko v številnih scenarijih, omejenih z izkušnjami in znanjem, uporabniki vedo, kaj potrebujejo, vendar še vedno težko ugotovijo jasne in specifične cilje z določitvijo vseh potrebnih slotov.', 'bo': 'སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མ་འགོ་འཛུགས་པ་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་རྟོགས་ཡོད་པ དཔེར་ན། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་གཡོག་གཡུལ་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་དང་། དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་འགྲུལ་སྐབས་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། scenarios many, limited by experience and knowledge, users may know what they need, but still struggle to figure out clear and specific objectives by determining the necessary slots all.'}
{'en': '', 'fr': "Adaptation de domaine semi-supervisée pour l'analyse des dépendances avec un réseau de correspondance dynamique", 'ar': 'تكييف المجال شبه الخاضع للإشراف لتحليل التبعية مع شبكة المطابقة الديناميكية', 'es': 'Adaptación de dominio semisupervisada para el análisis de dependencias con Dynamic Matching Network', 'ja': 'ダイナミックマッチングネットワークによる依存関係解析のための半監督ドメインの適応', 'pt': 'Adaptação de domínio semissupervisionada para análise de dependência com rede de correspondência dinâmica', 'hi': 'डायनेमिक मिलान नेटवर्क के साथ निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित डोमेन अनुकूलन', 'zh': '盖动网络之恃解析半监适配', 'ru': 'Полуконтролируемая адаптация домена для анализа зависимостей с помощью сети динамического сопоставления', 'ga': 'Oiriúnú Fearainn Leath-mhaoirsithe le haghaidh Parsáil Spleáchais le Líonra Meaitseála Dinimiciúla', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή ημιεποπτευόμενου τομέα για ανάλυση εξάρτησης με δυναμικό δίκτυο αντιστοίχισης', 'ka': 'ნახევარჯიშირი დომენის ადაპტიფიკაცია განსაკუთრებულობისთვის პარამეტრებისთვის დინამიკური თანამდვილეობის ქსელით', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt domain adaptáció a függőség-értelmezéshez dinamikus egyezési hálózattal', 'kk': 'Динамикалық сәйкес желімен тәуелдік талдау үшін жарты бақылау домен адаптациясы', 'mk': 'Половина надгледувана адаптација на домен за анализирање зависности со динамска мрежа за совпаѓање', 'it': "Adattamento del dominio semi-supervisionato per l'analisi delle dipendenze con Dynamic Matching Network", 'lt': 'Pusprižiūrimas domeno pritaikymas priklausomybės analizei su dinaminiu derinimo tinklu', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Domain Semi-dijaga untuk Menghurai Dependensi dengan Rangkaian Persamaan Dinamik', 'ml': 'ഡിനാനിമിക്ക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d സെമിമി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടു', 'mt': 'Adattament ta’ Domain Semi-Sorveljat għall-Analiżi tad-Dipendenza man-Netwerk ta’ Tqabbil Dinamiku', 'mn': 'Динамик холбоотой хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай холбоотой холбоотой загварын төлөвлөгөө', 'no': 'Halvoversikt domeneadaptasjon for avhengighetstolking med dynamisk samsvarande nettverk', 'pl': 'Pół nadzorowana adaptacja domeny dla parowania zależności z Dynamic Matching Network', 'ro': 'Adaptare semi-supravegheată a domeniului pentru analizarea dependenței cu rețeaua de potrivire dinamică', 'sr': 'Полунадзорена адаптация домена за анализиране зависимости са динамичним мрежом подпадања', 'si': 'විශේෂතාවක් විශේෂය සඳහා විශේෂතාවක් සඳහා පරික්ෂණය සඳහා පරික්ෂණය සඳහා පරික්ෂණය සඳහා අධ', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த பாடலுக்கான களம் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது Dynamic பொருத்தும் வலைப்பின்னல்', 'sv': 'Delvis övervakad domänanpassning för beroendetolkning med dynamiskt matchande nätverk', 'ur': 'ڈینامیکی مٹینٹ نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ ڈیمین اڈپٹیٹ کے لئے نصف-supervised Domain Adaptation', 'so': 'Adaptation of the Domain dependency Parsing with Dynamic Matching Network', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chỉ cần quản lý nền để xử lý độ phụ thuộc với mạng lưới ứng động', 'bg': 'Полунадзорна адаптация на домейна за анализ на зависимостта с динамична съвпадение мрежа', 'hr': 'Polovično nadzirana adaptacija domena za razmatranje ovisnosti s dinamičkom mrežom odgovarajuće', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised domeinaanpassing voor afhankelijkheidsparsing met Dynamic Matching Network', 'da': 'Delvist overvåget domænetilpasning til afhængighedsanalyse med dynamisk matchingsnetværk', 'de': 'Halbüberwachte Domänenanpassung für Dependency Parsing mit Dynamic Matching Network', 'ko': '동적 매칭 네트워크 기반의 반 감독역 적응 의존 분석', 'id': 'Penyesuaian Domain Semi-Disupervisi untuk Analisasi Dependensi dengan Rangkaian Perpadanan Dinamik', 'fa': 'انتقال دومین نیمه مراقبت وابستگی با شبکه داینامیکی متفاوت', 'sw': 'Tafsiri kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Kutegemea na Mtandao wa Matukio ya Kidynami', 'tr': 'Gandalyklık Aç ile Semi-gözlemli Taýramlyk Açması için Taýramlyk Etkileşimi', 'af': 'Semi- superviseer domein aanpassing vir afhanklikheid oordeling met dinamiese ooreenstemmende netwerk', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i mbikqyrur nga domeni për analizimin e varësive me rrjetin dinamik të përputhjes', 'bn': 'নির্ভরিত পার্সিং এর জন্য ডোমেইন পর্যবেক্ষণ- পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে ডায়ানামিক মিশ্রিত নেটওয়ার্ক দিয়ে', 'hy': 'Դինամիկ համապատասխանող ցանցի մեջ կախվածությունների վերլուծության համար', 'az': 'Dinamik İşdirilən Ağ ilə bağlılıq analizi üçün yarı-gözləyirli Domena Adjustasyonu', 'bs': 'Polovično nadzirana adaptacija domena za razmatranje zavisnosti sa dinamičkom mrežom odgovarajućeg', 'ca': "Adaptació semisupervisada del domini per l'analització de dependencies amb una xarxa dinàmica d'ajustament", 'cs': 'Adaptace domény s polovičním dohledem pro analýzu závislostí s dynamickou sítí přiřazení', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega domeeni kohandamine sõltuvuse parsimiseks dünaamilise sobitamise võrguga', 'fi': 'Osavalvottu verkkotunnuksen mukauttaminen riippuvuuden analysointia varten dynaamisella vastaavuusverkolla', 'jv': 'semi-control', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'התאמה למשטרה שמבוטחת בחצי עבור בדיקת תלויות ברשת התאמה דינמית', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovana prilagoditev domen za razčlenitev odvisnosti z dinamičnim ujemanjem omrežja', 'bo': 'རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ལ་མཐུན་མཐུན་དྲ་བ་དང་ལུགས་བསྒྱུར་བའི་དྲ་ཁོངས་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ'}
{'en': 'Dialog response generation in open domain is an important research topic where the main challenge is to generate relevant and diverse responses. In this paper, we propose a new dialog pre-training framework called DialogVED, which introduces continuous latent variables into the enhanced encoder-decoder pre-training framework to increase the relevance and diversity of responses. With the help of a large dialog corpus (Reddit), we pre-train the model using the following 4 tasks, used in training language models (LMs) and Variational Autoencoders (VAEs) literature: 1) masked language model; 2) response generation; 3) bag-of-words prediction; and 4) KL divergence reduction. We also add additional parameters to model the turn structure in dialogs to improve the performance of the pre-trained model. We conduct experiments on PersonaChat, DailyDialog, and DSTC7-AVSD benchmarks for response generation. Experimental results show that our model achieves the new state-of-the-art results on all these datasets.', 'ar': 'حققت نماذج التحليل الخاضع للإشراف نتائج رائعة في النصوص الموجودة في المجال. ومع ذلك ، انخفض أدائهم بشكل كبير على النصوص خارج المجال بسبب تحول توزيع البيانات. أظهر النموذج المشترك والخاص مزاياه الواعدة للتخفيف من هذه المشكلة عبر فصل الميزات ، بينما تولي الأعمال السابقة مزيدًا من الاهتمام لتعزيز الميزات المشتركة ولكنها تهمل الصلة العميقة لميزات معينة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، قمنا لأول مرة بتطبيق شبكة مطابقة ديناميكية على نموذج مشترك خاص لتحليل التبعية عبر المجالات شبه الخاضع للإشراف. وفي الوقت نفسه ، بالنظر إلى ندرة البيانات المسمى المجال الهدف ، فإننا نستفيد من البيانات غير المسماة من جانبين ، أي تصميم استراتيجية تدريب جديدة لتحسين قدرة شبكة المطابقة الديناميكية وضبط BERT للحصول على تمثيلات سياقية ذات صلة بالمجال. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعات البيانات المعيارية أن نموذجنا المقترح يتفوق باستمرار على خطوط الأساس المختلفة ، مما يؤدي إلى نتائج جديدة على أحدث طراز في جميع المجالات. يوضح التحليل التفصيلي لاستراتيجيات المطابقة المختلفة أنه من الضروري تعلم الأوزان المطابقة المناسبة للتأكيد على الميزات المفيدة وتجاهل الميزات غير المفيدة أو حتى الضارة. إلى جانب ذلك ، يمكن أن يمتد نموذجنا المقترح مباشرة إلى تكييف المجال متعدد المصادر ويحقق أفضل أداء بين خطوط الأساس المختلفة ، مما يزيد من التحقق من الفعالية والمتانة.', 'fr': "Les modèles d'analyse supervisée ont obtenu des résultats impressionnants sur les textes internes au domaine. Cependant, leurs performances chutent considérablement sur les textes hors domaine en raison du changement de distribution des données. Le modèle partagé-privé a montré ses avantages prometteurs pour atténuer ce problème grâce à la séparation des caractéristiques, alors que les travaux antérieurs accordent plus d'attention à l'amélioration des fonctionnalités partagées mais négligent la pertinence profonde de certaines fonctionnalités spécifiques. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous appliquons pour la première fois un réseau de correspondance dynamique sur le modèle partagé-privé pour l'analyse semi-supervisée des dépendances inter-domaines. Parallèlement, compte tenu de la rareté des données étiquetées dans le domaine cible, nous exploitons les données non étiquetées sous deux aspects, à savoir la conception d'une nouvelle stratégie de formation pour améliorer la capacité du réseau d'appariement dynamique et le réglage fin du BERT pour obtenir des représentations contextualisées liées au domaine. Les expériences réalisées sur des ensembles de données de référence montrent que le modèle proposé surpasse constamment les différentes lignes de base, ce qui conduit à de nouveaux résultats de pointe dans tous les domaines. Une analyse détaillée des différentes stratégies d'appariement montre qu'il est essentiel d'apprendre des pondérations d'appariement appropriées pour mettre en valeur les fonctionnalités utiles et ignorer celles qui sont inutiles ou même nuisibles. En outre, le modèle que nous proposons peut être directement étendu à l'adaptation de domaines multi-sources et permet d'obtenir les meilleures performances parmi les différentes lignes de base, en vérifiant davantage l'efficacité et la robustesse.", 'es': 'Los modelos de análisis supervisado han logrado resultados impresionantes en textos dentro del dominio. Sin embargo, su rendimiento cae drásticamente en los textos fuera del dominio debido al cambio en la distribución de datos. El modelo compartido-privado ha demostrado sus prometedoras ventajas para aliviar este problema mediante la separación de características, mientras que los trabajos anteriores prestan más atención a mejorar las características compartidas, pero descuidan la relevancia profunda de las específicas. Para abordar este problema, aplicamos por primera vez una red de coincidencia dinámica en el modelo compartido-privado para el análisis de dependencias entre dominios semisupervisado. Mientras tanto, teniendo en cuenta la escasez de datos etiquetados del dominio de destino, aprovechamos los datos no etiquetados de dos aspectos, es decir, el diseño de una nueva estrategia de capacitación para mejorar la capacidad de la red de correspondencia dinámica y el ajuste de BERT para obtener representaciones contextualizadas relacionadas con el dominio. Los experimentos en conjuntos de datos de referencia muestran que nuestro modelo propuesto supera sistemáticamente a varias líneas de base, lo que lleva a nuevos resultados de vanguardia en todos los dominios. El análisis detallado de las diferentes estrategias de emparejamiento demuestra que es esencial aprender los pesos de emparejamiento adecuados para enfatizar las características útiles e ignorar las inútiles o incluso perjudiciales. Además, nuestro modelo propuesto se puede extender directamente a la adaptación de dominios de múltiples fuentes y logra los mejores rendimientos entre varias líneas de base, verificando aún más la eficacia y la solidez.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de análise supervisionada alcançaram resultados impressionantes em textos no domínio. No entanto, seus desempenhos caem drasticamente em textos fora do domínio devido à mudança na distribuição de dados. O modelo compartilhado-privado mostrou suas vantagens promissoras para aliviar esse problema por meio da separação de recursos, enquanto trabalhos anteriores prestam mais atenção para aprimorar recursos compartilhados, mas negligenciam a relevância profunda de recursos específicos. Para resolver esse problema, aplicamos pela primeira vez uma rede de correspondência dinâmica no modelo privado compartilhado para análise semi-supervisionada de dependência entre domínios. Enquanto isso, considerando a escassez de dados rotulados no domínio-alvo, aproveitamos os dados não rotulados de dois aspectos, ou seja, projetando uma nova estratégia de treinamento para melhorar a capacidade da rede de correspondência dinâmica e ajustar o BERT para obter representações contextualizadas relacionadas ao domínio. Experimentos em conjuntos de dados de referência mostram que nosso modelo proposto supera consistentemente várias linhas de base, levando a novos resultados de última geração em todos os domínios. A análise detalhada de diferentes estratégias de correspondência demonstra que é essencial aprender pesos de correspondência adequados para enfatizar recursos úteis e ignorar os inúteis ou até prejudiciais. Além disso, nosso modelo proposto pode ser estendido diretamente para adaptação de domínio multi-fonte e alcança melhores desempenhos entre várias linhas de base, verificando ainda mais a eficácia e robustez.', 'ja': '監視された解析モデルは、ドメイン内テキストで印象的な結果を達成しました。 しかし、データ配布のシフトにより、ドメイン外のテキストでのパフォーマンスが激減しています。 共有-プライベートモデルは、機能分離を通じてこの問題を緩和するための有望な利点を示していますが、以前の作品は共有機能の強化により注意を払っていますが、特定の機能の深い関連性を無視しています。 この問題に対処するために、私たちは初めて、半監督型クロスドメイン依存関係解析のために共有-プライベートモデルに動的マッチングネットワークを適用しました。 一方、ターゲットドメイン標識データの希少性を考慮して、私たちは2つの側面からラベル付けされていないデータを活用します。つまり、動的マッチングネットワークの能力を向上させるための新しいトレーニング戦略を設計し、ドメイン関連のコンテキスト化された表現を取得するためにBERTを微調整します。 ベンチマークデータセットの実験では、提案されているモデルが様々なベースラインを一貫して上回り、すべてのドメインで最新の結果をもたらしていることが示されています。 さまざまなマッチング戦略の詳細な分析は、有用な特徴を強調し、役に立たない、または有害なものを無視するために、適切なマッチングの重みを学ぶことが不可欠であることを示しています。 さらに、提案されたモデルは、マルチソースドメインアダプタに直接拡張することができ、さまざまなベースラインの間で最高のパフォーマンスを達成し、有効性と堅牢性をさらに検証します。', 'ru': 'Модели контролируемого синтаксического анализа достигли впечатляющих результатов в отношении внутридоменных текстов. Однако их производительность резко падает на внедоменных текстах из-за сдвига в распределении данных. Модель "общий-частный" показала свои многообещающие преимущества для облегчения этой проблемы посредством разделения признаков, в то время как предыдущие работы уделяют больше внимания улучшению общих признаков, но игнорируют глубокую релевантность конкретных. Для решения этой проблемы мы впервые применяем динамическую сеть сопоставления на модели shared-private для полунадзорного междоменного анализа зависимостей. Тем временем, учитывая нехватку данных, помеченных целевым доменом, мы используем немеченные данные из двух аспектов, то есть, разработку новой стратегии обучения для улучшения возможностей сети динамического сопоставления и тонкой настройки BERT для получения контекстуализированных представлений, связанных с доменом. Эксперименты с базовыми наборами данных показывают, что предлагаемая нами модель неизменно превосходит различные базовые линии, что приводит к новым современным результатам во всех областях. Подробный анализ различных стратегий сопоставления показывает, что важно выучить подходящие подходящие веса, чтобы подчеркнуть полезные свойства и игнорировать бесполезные или даже вредные. Кроме того, предлагаемая нами модель может быть непосредственно распространена на адаптацию домена из нескольких источников и достигает наилучших показателей среди различных базовых линий, дополнительно проверяя эффективность и устойчивость.', 'hi': 'पर्यवेक्षित पार्सिंग मॉडल ने इन-डोमेन ग्रंथों पर प्रभावशाली परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं। हालांकि, डेटा वितरण शिफ्ट के कारण आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन ग्रंथों पर उनके प्रदर्शन में काफी गिरावट आई है। साझा-निजी मॉडल ने सुविधा अलगाव के माध्यम से इस समस्या को कम करने के लिए अपने आशाजनक लाभ दिखाए हैं, जबकि पहले के काम साझा सुविधाओं को बढ़ाने के लिए अधिक ध्यान देते हैं लेकिन विशिष्ट लोगों की गहराई से प्रासंगिकता की उपेक्षा करते हैं। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम पहली बार अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित क्रॉस-डोमेन निर्भरता पार्सिंग के लिए साझा-निजी मॉडल पर डायनेमिक मिलान नेटवर्क लागू करते हैं। इस बीच, लक्ष्य-डोमेन लेबल डेटा की कमी को ध्यान में रखते हुए, हम दो पहलुओं से बिना लेबल वाले डेटा का लाभ उठाते हैं, यानी, गतिशील मिलान नेटवर्क की क्षमता में सुधार करने के लिए एक नई प्रशिक्षण रणनीति तैयार करना और डोमेन से संबंधित प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए BERT को ठीक-ट्यून करना। बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल लगातार विभिन्न बेसलाइनों को मात देता है, जिससे सभी डोमेन पर नए अत्याधुनिक परिणाम होते हैं। विभिन्न मिलान रणनीतियों पर विस्तृत विश्लेषण दर्शाता है कि उपयोगी सुविधाओं पर जोर देने और बेकार या यहां तक कि हानिकारक लोगों को अनदेखा करने के लिए उपयुक्त मिलान वजन सीखना आवश्यक है। इसके अलावा, हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल को सीधे बहु-स्रोत डोमेन अनुकूलन तक बढ़ाया जा सकता है और विभिन्न बेसलाइनों के बीच सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, आगे प्रभावशीलता और मजबूती को सत्यापित करता है।', 'zh': '监督解析模形域内文本,取其深者。 然数据分布偏移,其在域外文本性急剧下降。 共享-私有模形已见离解之势,而前事益重,忽特定之深相关性。 先共-私,以动配网络,以半监之跨域恃其解析。 且夫趣域之稀缺性,两用未标之数,设新策以崇动网络之能,而微BERT以关上下之化。 准数之实验,始终优于百基线,而生新于百域之上。 异策之详细分析,学当之权重,而忽无用之害至重。 至于多源域,极于诸基线,益验其有效性鲁棒性。', 'ga': 'Tá torthaí suntasacha bainte amach ag samhlacha parsála maoirsithe ar théacsanna san fhearann. Mar sin féin, titeann a bhfeidhmíocht go mór ar théacsanna lasmuigh den fhearann mar gheall ar an aistriú dáileacháin sonraí. Léirigh an tsamhail phríobháideach roinnte na buntáistí a bhfuil gealladh fúthu maidir leis an bhfadhb seo a mhaolú trí ghné a scaradh, ach tugann saothair roimhe seo aird níos mó ar ghnéithe comhroinnte a fheabhsú ach déantar faillí ar ábharthacht dhomhain na sainghnéithe. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, cuirimid líonra meaitseála dinimiciúil i bhfeidhm den chéad uair ar an tsamhail phríobháideach roinnte do pharsáil spleáchais thras-fhearainn leath-mhaoirsithe. Idir an dá linn, ag cur san áireamh ganntanas sonraí lipéadaithe spriocfhearainn, déanaimid sonraí neamhlipéadaithe a ghiaráil ó dhá ghné, i.e. straitéis oiliúna nua a dhearadh chun cumas an líonra meaitseála dinimiciúil a fheabhsú agus mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar BERT chun uiríll comhthéacsaithe a bhaineann leis an bhfearann a fháil. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí tagarmhairc go sáraíonn ár múnla molta go seasta bonnlínte éagsúla, as a dtagann torthaí nua den scoth i ngach réimse. Léiríonn anailís mhionsonraithe ar straitéisí meaitseála éagsúla go bhfuil sé riachtanach meáchain oiriúnacha meaitseála a fhoghlaim chun béim a leagan ar ghnéithe úsáideacha agus neamhaird a dhéanamh ar na cinn neamhúsáidte nó fiú dochracha. Ina theannta sin, is féidir ár múnla molta a leathnú go díreach chuig oiriúnú fearainn ilfhoinse agus baintear amach an fheidhmíocht is fearr i measc bonnlínte éagsúla, ag fíorú a thuilleadh éifeachtachta agus daingne.', 'el': 'Τα εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα ανάλυσης έχουν επιτύχει εντυπωσιακά αποτελέσματα σε κείμενα εντός τομέα. Ωστόσο, οι επιδόσεις τους πέφτουν δραστικά σε κείμενα εκτός πεδίου λόγω της μετατόπισης διανομής δεδομένων. Το κοινό-ιδιωτικό μοντέλο έχει δείξει τα ελπιδοφόρα πλεονεκτήματά του για την ανακούφιση αυτού του προβλήματος μέσω του διαχωρισμού χαρακτηριστικών, ενώ προηγούμενες εργασίες δίνουν μεγαλύτερη προσοχή στην ενίσχυση των κοινών χαρακτηριστικών, αλλά παραμελούν τη σε βάθος συνάφεια συγκεκριμένων χαρακτηριστικών. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, εφαρμόζουμε για πρώτη φορά ένα δυναμικό δίκτυο αντιστοίχισης στο κοινόχρηστο-ιδιωτικό μοντέλο για ημιεπιτήρηση ανάλυσης εξάρτησης μεταξύ τομέων. Εν τω μεταξύ, λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τη σπανιότητα δεδομένων με ετικέτα στον τομέα του στόχου, αξιοποιούμε δεδομένα χωρίς ετικέτα από δύο πτυχές, δηλαδή τον σχεδιασμό μιας νέας στρατηγικής κατάρτισης για τη βελτίωση της ικανότητας του δυναμικού δικτύου αντιστοίχισης και τον συντονισμό για την απόκτηση αναπαραστάσεων που σχετίζονται με τον τομέα. Τα πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά σταθερά τις διάφορες γραμμές βάσης, οδηγώντας σε νέα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε όλους τους τομείς. Η λεπτομερής ανάλυση των διαφορετικών στρατηγικών αντιστοίχισης δείχνει ότι είναι απαραίτητο να μάθετε κατάλληλα βάρη αντιστοίχισης για να τονίσετε χρήσιμα χαρακτηριστικά και να αγνοήσετε άχρηστα ή ακόμη και επιβλαβή. Εκτός αυτού, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μπορεί να επεκταθεί άμεσα στην προσαρμογή πολλών πηγών και επιτυγχάνει καλύτερες επιδόσεις μεταξύ διαφόρων γραμμών βάσης, επαληθεύοντας περαιτέρω την αποτελεσματικότητα και την ανθεκτικότητα.', 'hu': 'A felügyelt elemzési modellek lenyűgöző eredményeket értek el a domain belüli szövegekben. Teljesítményük azonban drasztikusan csökken a domainen kívüli szövegeken az adatforgalom-eltolódás miatt. A megosztott-magánmodell ígéretes előnyeit mutatta a probléma szétválasztásával való enyhítésében, míg a korábbi munkák nagyobb figyelmet fordítanak a közös jellemzők javítására, de figyelmen kívül hagyják az egyes jellemzők mélyreható relevanciáját. A probléma megoldása érdekében először alkalmazunk dinamikus megfelelő hálózatot a megosztott-privát modellre a félig felügyelt tartományközi függőségek elemzéséhez. Mindeközben figyelembe véve a céltartományban jelölt adatok hiányát, a címke nélküli adatokat két szempontból használjuk ki, azaz új képzési stratégiát dolgozunk ki a dinamikus egyeztetési hálózat képességének javítására, valamint a BERT finomhangolására a domain-kapcsolódó kontextuális reprezentációk elérésére. A benchmark adatkészletekkel végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk következetesen felülmúlja a különböző alapvető értékeket, ami minden területen új, korszerű eredményekhez vezet. A különböző illeszkedési stratégiák részletes elemzése azt mutatja, hogy elengedhetetlen a megfelelő illeszkedési súlyok megtanulása, hogy hangsúlyozzák a hasznos funkciókat, és figyelmen kívül hagyják a használhatatlanokat vagy akár a károkat. Emellett javasolt modellünk közvetlenül kiterjeszthető a többforrásból származó domain adaptációra, és a legjobb teljesítményt érheti el a különböző alapvonalak között, tovább ellenőrizve a hatékonyságot és a robusztusságot.', 'ka': 'მონაცემებული პარაზილის მოდელები მონაცემული მოდელების შესაძლებელი შედეგები დომინის ტექსტში. მაგრამ, მათი გამოყენებები დირასტიკურად მონაცემების გარეშე ტექსტში გადატანა. გაყოფილი პირადი მოდელი გამოჩვენეთ მისი მუშაობელი პრობლემების გახსნა, როგორც პირადი მუშაობაში უფრო მეტი მნიშვნელობის გახსნა, მაგრამ განსაზღვრებული პრობლემების გახსნა, მაგრამ განსა ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ პირველად დინამიკური შესაბამისი ქსელის გამოყენებას დავყენებთ, რომელიც გაყოფილი პრობილური მოდელში დავუმართოთ პრობილურ მაშინ, მინიშვნელოვანი დემომინის მონაცემების შესახებ, ჩვენ ორი აპექტიუალური მონაცემების გამოყენება, ანუ, ახალი სტრექტიფიკაციის სტრექტიფიკაციის შესაძლებლობას გაუქმება დინამიკური მსგავსი ქსელის შესაძლებლობა და BERT- მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოცდილებები ჩვენი მოდელის მონაცემები მუშაობელია განსხვავებული ფესტილის გამოცდილება, რომელიც ყველა დიომენზე ახალი მონაცემების განსხვავება. განსხვავებული სტრატიგიების განსაკუთრებული ანალიზაცია აჩვენებს, რომ საჭირო სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ ს დამატებით, ჩვენი მოდელ შეიძლება მიზეზად გავაკეთოთ მრავალური დიომინის ადატაციაციას და გავაკეთოთ უკეთესი გამოსახულება განსხვავებული ფესტური ხაზების შორის, დამატე', 'it': "I modelli di analisi supervisionati hanno ottenuto risultati impressionanti sui testi in-domain. Tuttavia, le loro prestazioni diminuiscono drasticamente sui testi fuori dominio a causa del cambiamento della distribuzione dei dati. Il modello condiviso-privato ha mostrato i suoi promettenti vantaggi per alleviare questo problema attraverso la separazione delle caratteristiche, mentre i lavori precedenti prestano maggiore attenzione a migliorare le caratteristiche condivise ma trascurano la rilevanza approfondita di quelle specifiche. Per risolvere questo problema, per la prima volta applichiamo una rete di corrispondenza dinamica sul modello condiviso-privato per l'analisi delle dipendenze cross-domain semi-supervisionata. Nel frattempo, considerando la scarsità di dati etichettati con dominio target, sfruttiamo i dati non etichettati da due aspetti, ad esempio progettando una nuova strategia di formazione per migliorare la capacità della rete di matching dinamico e regolando BERT per ottenere rappresentazioni contestualizzate relative al dominio. Esperimenti su set di dati di benchmark mostrano che il nostro modello proposto supera costantemente le varie linee di base, portando a nuovi risultati all'avanguardia su tutti i domini. Un'analisi dettagliata su diverse strategie di matching dimostra che è essenziale imparare pesi adatti per enfatizzare le caratteristiche utili e ignorare quelli inutili o addirittura dannosi. Inoltre, il nostro modello proposto può essere esteso direttamente all'adattamento multi-source del dominio e raggiunge le migliori prestazioni tra le varie linee di base, verificandone ulteriormente l'efficacia e la robustezza.", 'kk': 'Бақылаулы талдау үлгілері домен мәтіндерінде әсер ететін нәтижелерді жетті. Бірақ олардың оқиғалары деректер үлестірімі өзгертілген домен мәтіндерінің сыртқы мәтіндеріне драстикалық қалды. Ортақ жеке үлгісі бұл мәселеді бөлу арқылы көшірмелеу үшін өзінің әлемді артықшылығын көрсетті, бірақ алдындағы жұмыс істейді бөлікті мүмкіндіктерді көтеру үшін көбірек болып, бірақ бөл Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін бірінші рет біз динамикалық сәйкес желіне ортақ- жеке үлгісін біртінші қарау үшін бір- бірінші рет қолданамыз. Осы уақытта, мақсатты доменге жарлық деген деректердің қауіпсіздігін қарастырып, екі аспектен жазылмаған деректерді, мысалы, доменге сәйкес келетін желінің динамикалық және баптау мүмкіндігін жақсарту үшін жаңа оқыту стратегиясын құру үші Белгі деректер қорларының тәжірибелері келтірілген моделіміздің түрлі негізгі сызықтарды өзгертіп, барлық домендердің жаңа күй- жай нәтижелерін жасайды. Басқа сәйкес келетін стратегиялар туралы егжей- тегжейі анализ пайдалы мүмкіндіктерді бағыттау және қауіпсіздіктерді елемеу үшін сәйкес келетін тегжейлерді оқыту үшін қажетті болад Біздің қолданыстағы моделіміз көп көзгертілген домендің адаптациясына тікелей кеңейтуге болады және түрлі негізгі сызықтардың арасындағы ең жақсы оқиғаларды жеткізе алады, әсер ет', 'lt': 'Supervised parsing models have achieved impressive results on in-domain texts.  Tačiau dėl duomenų pasiskirstymo pokyčių jų veiklos rezultatai labai mažėja ne srities tekstuose. Pasidalijamojo ir privačiojo sektorių modelis parodė savo perspektyvius pranašumus išspręsti šią problem ą atskiriant savybes, o ankstesniuose darbuose daugiau dėmesio skiriama bendrų savybių stiprinimui, tačiau neatsižvelgiama į išsamią konkrečių savybių svarbą. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, pirmą kartą naudojame dinamišką derinimo tinklą pasidalijamojo ir privačiojo sektorių priklausomybės analizės pusiau prižiūrimo modelio atžvilgiu. Tuo tarpu, atsižvelgiant į tikslinės srities pažymėtų duomenų trūkumą, mes sutelkiame dviejų aspektų, t. y. parengiame naują mokymo strategiją, kuria siekiama pagerinti dinamiško derinimo tinklo pajėgumus ir patobulinti BERT, kad būtų galima gauti su sritimi susijusius kontekstinius atstovavimus. Eksperimentai, susiję su lyginamųjų duomenų rinkiniais, rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis nuosekliai viršija įvairias bazines linijas, o tai lemia naujausius rezultatus visose srityse. Išsami įvairių atitikties strategijų analizė rodo, kad būtina išmokti tinkamų atitikties svorių, kad būtų pabrėžiami naudingi požymiai ir ignoruojami nenaudojami ar net kenksmingi. Be to, mūsų siūlomas modelis gali būti tiesiogiai išplėstas ir pritaikytas daugialypėms sritims ir pasiektas geriausias įvairių bazinių linijų rezultatas, toliau tikrinant veiksmingumą ir patikimumą.', 'ms': 'Model penghuraian diawasi telah mencapai keputusan yang mengesankan pada teks dalam domain. Namun, prestasi mereka jatuh secara drastik pada teks luar domain disebabkan perubahan distribusi data. Model peribadi-berkongsi telah menunjukkan keuntungan yang berjanji untuk mengurangi masalah ini melalui pemisahan ciri-ciri, manakala kerja sebelumnya memberi lebih perhatian untuk meningkatkan ciri-ciri berkongsi tetapi mengabaikan relevansi dalam-dalam yang spesifik. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kita untuk pertama kalinya melaksanakan rangkaian yang sepadan dinamik pada model peribadi-berkongsi untuk penghuraian dependensi cross-domain yang semi-dijaga. Sementara itu, mempertimbangkan kekurangan data yang ditabel domain-sasaran, kami menggunakan data yang tidak ditabel dari dua aspek, iaitu, merancang strategi latihan baru untuk meningkatkan kemampuan rangkaian yang sepadan dinamik dan memperbaiki BERT untuk mendapatkan perwakilan kontekstualisasi berkaitan dengan domain. Eksperimen pada set data tanda rujukan menunjukkan bahawa model kami diusulkan secara konsisten melampaui berbeza garis dasar, yang membawa kepada keputusan state-of-the-art baru pada semua domain. Analisis terperinci pada strategi persamaan yang berbeza menunjukkan bahawa penting untuk belajar berat persamaan yang sesuai untuk menekankan ciri-ciri berguna dan mengabaikan yang tidak berguna atau bahkan yang berbahaya. Selain itu, model kami diusulkan boleh terus dilambangkan kepada penyesuaian domain berbilang-sumber dan mencapai prestasi terbaik diantara berbeza garis dasar, mengesahkan lebih lanjut keefektivitas dan kepekatan.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli ta’ analiżi sorveljati kisbu riżultati impressjonanti fuq testi fid-dominju. Madankollu, il-prestazzjonijiet tagħhom jonqsu drastikament fuq testi barra d-dominju minħabba l-bidla fid-distribuzzjoni tad-dejta. Il-mudell kondiviż-privat wera l-vantaġġi promettenti tiegħu biex itaffi din il-problema permezz tas-separazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi, filwaqt li xogħlijiet preċedenti jagħtu aktar attenzjoni biex itejbu l-karatteristiċi kondiviżi iżda jinjoraw ir-rilevanza fil-fond ta’ dawk speċifiċi. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, għall-ewwel darba napplikaw netwerk dinamiku ta’ tqabbil fuq il-mudell maqsum-privat għall-analiżi tad-dipendenza transdomestika semisorveljata. Sadanittant, meta wieħed jikkunsidra l-iskarsezza tad-dejta ttikkettata fid-dominju fil-mira, a ħna nħe ġġu d-dejta mhux ittikkettata minn żewġ aspetti, jiġifieri t-tfassil ta’ strateġija ġdida ta’ taħriġ biex tittejjeb il-kapaċità tan-netwerk dinamiku ta’ tqabbil u l-aġġustament tal-BERT biex jinkisbu rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati relatati mad-dominju. L-esperimenti dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li l-mudell propost tagħna b’mod konsistenti jeċċedi diversi linji bażi, li jwasslu għal riżultati ġodda ta’ l-aħħar fl-oqsma kollha. Analiżi dettaljata dwar strateġiji differenti ta’ tqabbil turi li huwa essenzjali li jitgħallmu piżijiet xierqa ta’ tqabbil biex jiġu enfasizzati karatteristiċi utli u jiġu injorati dawk inutili jew anke dawk ta’ ħsara. Barra minn hekk, il-mudell propost tagħna jista’ jiġi estiż direttament għall-adattament ta’ dominji b’diversi sorsi u jikseb l-aħjar prestazzjonijiet fost diversi linji bażi, b’aktar verifika tal-effettività u r-robustezza.', 'mk': 'Supervised parsing models have achieved impressive results on in-domain texts.  Сепак, нивните изведувања драстично се намалуваат на текстите надвор од доменот поради промената на дистрибуцијата на податоци. The shared-private model has shown its promising advantages for alleviating this problem via feature separation, whereas prior works pay more attention to enhance shared features but neglect the in-depth relevance of specific ones.  За да го решиме ова прашање, за прв пат ќе аплицираме динамична мрежа за совпаѓање на заедничкиот приватен модел за анализирање на полунадгледувана кросдомена зависност. Во меѓувреме, со оглед на недостатокот на податоци означени со домен-мета, ги искористуваме неозначените податоци од два аспекти, односно дизајнирање на нова стратегија за обука за подобрување на способноста на динамичната мрежа за совпаѓање и финетирање на БЕРТ за добивање контекстуални претставувања поврзани Експериментите на базите на податоци покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел постојано ги надминува различните бази, што води до нови најдобри резултати на сите домени. Деталната анализа на различните стратегии за совпаѓање покажува дека е суштинско да се научи соодветна совпаѓачка тежина за да се истакнат корисните карактеристики и да се игнорираат бескорисните или дури и штетните. Покрај тоа, нашиот предложен модел може директно да се прошири на адаптација на мнозинствени домени и да се постигнат најдобри резултати меѓу различните основни линии, понатаму верификувајќи ја ефикасноста и силноста.', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d മികച്ച ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഡേറ്റാ വിതരണ ശിഫ്റ്റ് കാരണം അവയുടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തുപോകാത്ത ടെക്സ്റ്റ പങ്കാളിയുള്ള സ്വകാര്യ മോഡല്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക സുഖാനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേക വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുവെക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പ് To address this issue, we for the first time apply a dynamic matching network on the shared-private model for semi-supervised cross-domain dependency parsing.  ഈ സമയത്ത്, ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ഡേറ്റാ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പേടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും അടയാളപ്പെടാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, അതായത് ഡൈനാമിക്ക് പൊരുതുന്ന ശൃംഖലയില്\u200d  ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന വ്യത്യസ്ത ത പൊരുതുന്ന പദ്ധതികളില്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന വിശദീകരണവിശദീകരണവും ഉപയോഗിക്കാത്ത വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗ അതിനു പുറമെ, നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d നേരിട്ട് പല-സ്രോതസ്സ് ഡൊമെയിനിലേക്ക് നീട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതാ', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдсэн хуваалцах загварууд домаар бичсэн текст дээр гайхалтай үр дүнг олсон. Гэвч тэдний үйл ажиллагаа өгөгдлийн хуваарилалтын шилжилтийн шалтгааныг шалтгаан дотор хэсгүйгээр унасан. Хувь хувийн загвар нь энэ асуудлыг хуваалцах аргаар амлалтай ашиг үзүүлсэн. Гэхдээ өмнө ажиллаж байсан нь хуваалцаагүй чадварыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд илүү анхаарлаа хандуулдаг, гэхдээ тодорхой зүйлсийн гүн гүнзгий хамааралтай Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд бид анхны удаа хувийн загвар дээр хагас хязгаарлагдсан хамааралтай байдлын хувийн загварын хувьд хөгжүүлэх сүлжээг ашигладаг. Тэр үед, зорилготой холбооны нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн талаарх баталгаагүй өгөгдлийг хоёр талаас ашиглаж, яг л шинэ сургалтын стратегийг зохион байгуулахын тулд динамик холбоотой сүлжээний болон BERT-ын хөгжүүлэх чадварыг сайжруулахын тулд холбоотой орчин Бидний санал өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт нь олон суурь шулуунуудыг үргэлжлүүлдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь шинэ урлагийн үр дүнг бүх сүлжээнд хүргэсэн. Өөр төрлийн тоглоомын стратеги дээрх нарийвчлалтай шинжилгээ нь хэрэглэгдэхгүй, эсвэл хохиромжтой зүйлсийг тодорхойлох хэрэгтэй жинтэй сурах нь чухал гэдгийг харуулдаг. Үүнээс гадна бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь олон эх үүсвэрийн загварын загвар дээр шууд нэмэгдүүлж, олон суурь шулууны хооронд хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, үр дүнтэй болон хүчтэй байдлыг баталж болно', 'pl': 'Nadzorowane modele parsowania osiągnęły imponujące rezultaty na tekstach w domenie. Jednak ich wydajność drastycznie spada w tekstach poza domeną ze względu na zmianę dystrybucji danych. Model współdzielony-prywatny pokazał swoje obiecujące zalety dla złagodzenia tego problemu poprzez separację cech, podczas gdy poprzednie prace zwracają większą uwagę na wzmocnienie cech wspólnych, lecz zaniedbują dogłębne znaczenie konkretnych cech. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, po raz pierwszy stosujemy dynamiczną sieć dopasowania do modelu współdzielonego i prywatnego do parsowania zależności między domenami pół-nadzorowanego. Tymczasem, biorąc pod uwagę niedobór danych oznaczonych w domenie docelowej, wykorzystujemy dane nieoznakowane z dwóch aspektów, tj. projektowania nowej strategii szkoleniowej w celu poprawy zdolności dynamicznej sieci dopasowywania i dostosowania BERT do uzyskania kontekstualizowanych reprezentacji związanych z domeną. Eksperymenty na zbiorach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że nasz proponowany model konsekwentnie przewyższa różne linie bazowe, co prowadzi do nowych, najnowocześniejszych wyników we wszystkich dziedzinach. Szczegółowa analiza różnych strategii dopasowania pokazuje, że konieczne jest nauczenie się odpowiednich wag dopasowania, aby podkreślić przydatne funkcje i ignorować bezużyteczne lub nawet szkodliwe. Ponadto nasz proponowany model może być bezpośrednio rozszerzony na adaptację domen wielu źródeł i osiąga najlepsze wyniki wśród różnych linii bazowych, dalej weryfikując skuteczność i solidność.', 'no': 'Overvakte tolkingsmodular har oppnådd impresiv resultat på tekstar i domenet. Dei utføringane blir imidlertid drastisk sleppa på tekstar uten domenet på grunn av forskyving av datafordelinga. Den delte private modellen har vist forbetringane for å gjere dette problemet med funksjonsseparasjon, mens førre arbeidar gjer meir oppmerksomhet til å forbetra delte funksjonar, men forstørra den djupne relevansen av spesifikke funksjonar. For å handtera dette problemet, bruker vi for første gong ein dynamisk tilsvarande nettverk på den delte private modellen for tolking av avhengighet med halvoversikt krysdomenet. I tillegg, ved å sjå på feil av måldområdet merket data, leverer vi ulike data frå to aspektar, dvs. å designa ein ny treningsstrategi for å forbetra kapasiteten for den dynamiske tilsvarande nettverket og finnstillingsBERT for å få kontekstualiserte representasjonar med domene. Eksperimentar på benchmarkdatasett viser at vår foreslått modell konsistent utfører ulike baselinjer, som fører til nye kunstige resultat på alle domene. Detaljerte analyse på ulike treff strategiar viser at det er nødvendig å lære passende vekt for å understreka nyttige funksjonar og ignorera nyttige eller til og med skade. I tillegg kan vårt foreslått modell direkte utvidast til fleirkjeldedomeneadaptasjon og oppnå beste utføringar mellom ulike grunnlinjer, så meir kan verifisere effektiviteten og kraftighet.', 'sr': 'Nadzorni modeli analize postigli su impresivni rezultati na tekstima u domenu. Međutim, njihove izvode drastično padaju na tekstove izvan domena zbog promene distribucije podataka. Podijeljeni privatni model pokazao je svoju obećavajuću prednost za ublažavanje ovog problema putem razdvajanja karakteristika, dok je prije djela obraćala više pažnje na poboljšanje zajedničkih karakteristika, ali zanemarila dubinu relevantnosti specifičnih. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, prvi put smo primjenjivali dinamičnu mrežu koja odgovara zajedničkom privatnom modelu za analizu zavisnosti polu-nadzornog krstodomena. U međuvremenu, s obzirom na nedostatak podataka označenih ciljnim domenom, iskorištavamo nepobeležene podatke iz dva aspekta, tj. dizajnirajući novu strategiju obuke kako bi poboljšali sposobnost dinamične mreže odgovarajuće i finalizirali BERT kako bi dobili kontekstualizirane predstave vezane za domenu. Eksperimenti na bazama podataka pokazuju da naš predloženi model konsekventno iznosi različite osnovne linije, što vodi do nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na svim domenima. Detaljna analiza o različitim odgovarajućim strategijama pokazuje da je važno naučiti odgovarajuće težine da naglasite korisne karakteristike i ignorirati beskorisne ili čak štetne. Osim toga, naš predloženi model se može direktno proširiti na adaptaciju multiizvorskih domena i ostvariti najbolje učinke među različitim osnovnim linijama, dalje provjeriti učinkovitost i jačanost.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණය කරපු විශේෂණ මොඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබුනා. නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණ විතරයෙන් දත්ත විතරයෙන් වෙනස් විසින් විසින් පිළිබඳ පැත්තට විසින් ව මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ විකල්පයක් විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා, ඒත් ම මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය කරන්න, අපි පළමුවෙනි වතාවට සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාසිත විධානය සඳහා කොටස් ප අන්තර්යයෙන්, ඉලක්ක-ඩෝමේන් ලේබල් කරපු දත්තේ නැති අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් බලන්න, අපි අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් දෙකක් ඉඳන් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් නැති දත්ත ගන්න, ඉතින්, අලුත් ප්\u200dරේක්ෂ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩල් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් විවිධ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුව වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතියේ විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ඒ වගේම, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරති', 'ro': 'Modelele de analizare supravegheate au obținut rezultate impresionante asupra textelor în domeniu. Cu toate acestea, performanțele lor scad drastic pe textele din afara domeniului din cauza schimbării distribuției datelor. Modelul partajat-privat și-a arătat avantajele promițătoare pentru atenuarea acestei probleme prin separarea caracteristicilor, în timp ce lucrările anterioare acordă mai multă atenție sporirii caracteristicilor partajate, dar neglijează relevanța profundă a unor caracteristici specifice. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, aplicăm pentru prima dată o rețea dinamică de potrivire pe modelul partajat-privat pentru analizarea dependențelor între domenii semi-supravegheate. Între timp, având în vedere deficitul de date etichetate cu domeniul țintă, valorificăm datele fără etichetare din două aspecte, și anume, proiectarea unei noi strategii de instruire pentru a îmbunătăți capacitatea rețelei de potrivire dinamică și reglarea fină a BERT pentru a obține reprezentări contextualizate legate de domeniu. Experimentele pe seturi de date de referință arată că modelul nostru propus depășește în mod constant diferitele linii de referință, conducând la noi rezultate de ultimă oră pe toate domeniile. Analiza detaliată a diferitelor strategii de potrivire demonstrează că este esențial să învățați greutățile potrivite pentru a sublinia caracteristicile utile și ignora cele inutile sau chiar dăunătoare. În plus, modelul nostru propus poate fi extins direct la adaptarea domeniului multi-sursă și obține cele mai bune performanțe între diferitele linii de bază, verificând în continuare eficiența și robustețea.', 'sv': 'Övervakade tolkningsmodeller har uppnått imponerande resultat på domäntexter. Deras prestanda sjunker dock drastiskt på texter utanför domänen på grund av skiftet i datadistributionen. Den delade-privata modellen har visat sina lovande fördelar för att lindra detta problem genom särskiljning, medan tidigare arbeten ägnar större uppmärksamhet åt att förbättra gemensamma särdrag men försummar den djupgående relevansen av specifika. För att åtgärda detta problem använder vi för första gången ett dynamiskt matchande nätverk på den delade-privata modellen för semi-övervakad beroendetolkning över domäner. Samtidigt, med tanke på bristen på måldomänmärkta data, utnyttjar vi omärkta data från två aspekter, dvs. utforma en ny utbildningsstrategi för att förbättra kapaciteten hos det dynamiska matchningsnätverket och finjustera BERT för att få domänrelaterade kontextuella representationer. Experiment på benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar att vår föreslagna modell konsekvent överträffar olika baslinjer, vilket leder till nya toppmoderna resultat på alla domäner. Detaljerad analys av olika matchningsstrategier visar att det är viktigt att lära sig lämpliga matchande vikter för att betona användbara funktioner och ignorera värdelösa eller till och med skadliga sådana. Dessutom kan vår föreslagna modell direkt utökas till multi-source domänanpassning och uppnår bästa prestanda bland olika baslinjer, ytterligare verifiering av effektivitet och robusthet.', 'ta': 'மேல்பார்க்கப்பட்ட பாடல் மாதிரிகள் டோமைன் உரைகளில் சிறந்த முடிவுகள் பெற்றுவிட்டன. ஆயினும், தரவு பங்கீட்டு மாற்றத்தினால் அவர்களுடைய செயல்பாடுகள் வெளியேறும் களம் உரைகளிலிருந்து மிகவும் வி பகிர்ந்த தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரி தனிப்பட்ட பண்புப் பிரிப்பு வழியாக இந்த பிரச்சனையை எளிதாக்குவதற்கு அதிக வாக்களிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஆனால் முன்னால் வேலை கு இந்த பிரச்சனையை முதலில் நாம் பகிர்ந்த- தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரியில் பொருந்தும் வலைப்பின்னலை பயன்படுத்துக இலக்கு- டோமைன் குறிப்பிட்ட தகவலின் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பை பார்த்தால், இரண்டு பக்கங்களிலிருந்து குறிப்பிடப்படாத தகவல்களை நாம் வழங்குகிறோம், அதாவது, புதிய பயிற்ச பெங்க்மார்க் தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி முறைமையாக வெளியேறும் பல அடிப்படைகளை ச வித்தியாசமான பொருத்தும் திட்டங்களில் விவரமான ஆய்வு காட்டுகிறது பொருத்தமான தூக்கங்களை கற்றுக்கொள்ள முக்கியமானது பயன்படும் பண்புகளை  அதற்கும் மேலும், எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி நேரடியாக பல மூல மூலத்தின் ஒதுக்கீட்டிற்கு விரிவாக்கப்படும் மற்றும் பல அடிக்கோடு', 'so': "Tusaalada baarlamaanka ee la soo jeedo waxay ka heleen resulto wanaagsan oo ku saabsan qoraalka gudaha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee sameyntoodu waxay si adag ugu soo saaraan qoraal aan degaanka ahayn sababtoo ah isbedelka tartanka. Tusaale qayb-gaar ah ayaa tusay faa'iidooyinkeeda loo ballanqaaday in loo fududeeyo dhibaatadan gooni gaar ah, laakiin shaqaalaha horay ayaa aad u sii jeeda inuu sii kordhiyo sharciyada la qaybiyey, laakiin iskaga tago faa'iidada hoose u dhow ee gaarka ah. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu ku codsanaynaa shabakadda isku xiran ee noocyada gaarka loo leeyahay u sameynta baaritaanka ku xiran ee qeyb-gaarka ah. Wakhtigaas, markaan ka fiirsanayno caqabadaha macluumaadka la qoray e e gudaha, waxaynu ka soo dirnaa macluumaad aan la aqoonsan labada dhinac, taas oo ah qoraal waxbarasho cusub si loo hagaajiyo awoodda dabiicadda u eg shabakadda iyo habboonaanta BERT, si aan u helno wakiilada la xiriira gudaha. Imtixaamo ku saabsan taariikhda bangiga waxay muuqataa in qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay dhamaan ka samaysaa saldhigyo kala duduwan, wuxuuna sababtaa resulto cusub xaalada farshaxanka ee dowlada oo dhan. Baaritaanka faa'iidada ah oo ku saabsan qoraalada isku mid ah waxay muujiyaan in loo baahan yahay in la barto miisaanka ku habboon, in lagu tuuro faa'iido faa'iido leh, iskaga tago kuwo aan faa'iido lahayn ama aan waxyeello lahayn. Sidoo kale modellka la soo jeeday waxaa toos loo sii fidin karaa bedelka deegaanka qaarkood oo kala duduwan, wuxuuna sameyn karaa bandhigyo wanaagsan oo ku saabsan saldhigyada kala duduwan, wuxuuna sii xaqiijin karaa shaqaalaha iyo dharka.", 'ur': 'سوپریزٹ پارسینگ موڈلیوں نے ڈومین ٹیکسٹوں پر اثر انگیز نتیجے پہنچ گئے ہیں. لیکن ان کی نمائش ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ شیفٹ کے باعث بغیر ڈیٹ ڈیٹ کے متعلق بغیر ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ مشترک خصوصی موڈل نے اس مسئلہ کو فرصت جدائی کے ذریعہ آسانی کرنے کے لئے اپنے وعدہ کا فائدہ دکھایا ہے، حالانکہ پہلے کام بھی مشترک فائدہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اضافہ کرنے کے لئے زیادہ توجه کرتا ہے لیکن مخصوص شخصوں کی عمیق اضافہ کو اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم پہلی بار ایک داینامیکل مطابق نیٹورک کو نصف-supervised کرس-ڈومین اعتباری پارسینگ کے لئے شریک-خصوصی موڈل پر لازم کریں گے. یہاں تک کہ ہدایت ڈومین کی کمزوری کا ذریعہ دیکھ لیتے ہیں، ہم دو منطق سے بغیر معلوم ہونے والی ڈاٹی کا ذریعہ لیتے ہیں، یعنی، ایک نئی ترینس استراتژی طراحی کرتا ہے کہ ڈیومین متصل کرنے والے نیٹ ورک کے قابلیت کو بہتر کریں اور نیٹ ٹیونینگ BERT کو ڈومین کے متصل ہو بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل مختلف بنسٹ لینوں سے زیادہ کامل ہوتی ہے، جو تمام ڈومین پر نئی حالت کی آرت نتیجے پہنچاتے ہیں. مختلف مطابق استراتژیکوں کے بارے میں تفصیل دکھاتی ہے کہ مطابق مطابق وزن کی تعریف کرنے کے لئے مناسب ہے اور فائدہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے فائدہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اور فائدہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے بھی اور اضافہ کرنے کے لئے بھی اضا اس کے علاوہ، ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل سیدھی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر', 'uz': "Name Lekin ularning amallari maʼlumotni ajratish shiftlari sababini domen matnlaridan tasavvur qiladi. Boʻlishilgan shaxsiy modeli bu muammolani xossa ajratish orqali yoqish uchun ishlatiladi, ammo oldin ishlayotgan xossalarni oshirish uchun qo'shimcha foydalanish mumkin, lekin foydalanuvchilarning eng aql muhimligini eslab qolish mumkin. Bu muammani boshqarish uchun biz birinchi marta birinchi marta birinchi bogʻliq tarmoqni qayta taʼminlovchi shaxsiy modelda qoʻllanmiz. Koʻrib chiqindilar qutisiga qoʻllaniladi. Meanwhile, considering the scarcity of target-domain labeled data, we leverage unlabeled data from two aspects, i.e., designing a new training strategy to improve the capability of the dynamic matching network and fine-tuning BERT to obtain domain-related contextualized representations.  Benchmark maʼlumotlar bazasining imtiyozlarini koʻrsatish mumkin, ilova qilingan modelmiz hamma domene davomida yangi holat va sanar natijalariga bajaradi. @ info Ko'pchilik modelimizni bir necha manba-manba domen adaptariga ko'paytirish mumkin va har xil asboblar bilan yaxshi bajarish natijalarini bajarish mumkin, va qo'llanmalarni ko'proq tasdiqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Kiểu phân tích theo luật đã đạt được kết quả ấn tượng trong nội dung. Tuy nhiên màn trình diễn của họ đã giảm trầm trọng trên các văn bản ngoài lãnh thổ do thay đổi phân phối dữ liệu. Mô hình chia sẻ tư nhân đã cho thấy những lợi ích hứa hẹn của nó để giải quyết vấn đề này qua sự phân biệt đặc tính, trong khi các công trình trước quan tâm nhiều hơn để nâng cao các đặc điểm chung, nhưng bỏ qua sự liên quan sâu sắc của những trường hợp cụ thể. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi lần đầu tiên áp dụng một mạng lưới ăn khớp động trên mô hình riêng tư chia sẻ cho phân tích phụ thuộc thuộc bán giám sát. Trong khi đó, xét đến sự hạn chế của dữ liệu nhãn miền đích, chúng ta sử dụng dữ liệu không tải từ hai khía cạnh, tức là thiết kế một chiến lược huấn luyện mới nhằm nâng cao khả năng của mạng lưới liên kết động động và kết thúc hoàn hảo giao ước ước ước theo miền để đạt các biểu hiện định. Thí nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn cho thấy mẫu thử của chúng tôi hoàn to àn vượt trội các nền tảng khác nhau, dẫn tới kết quả mới trên mọi miền. Phân tích chi tiết về các chiến lược tương ứng khác nhau cho thấy cần thiết phải học tập tạ thích hợp thích hợp để nhấn mạnh các yếu tố hữu ích và phớt lờ những yếu tố vô dụng hay thậm chí có hại. Bên cạnh đó, kiểu mẫu của chúng ta có thể được mở rộng trực tiếp đến việc thích nghi miền đa nguồn và đạt được những hiệu quả tốt nhất trong các căn cứ, để xác minh hiệu quả và độ bền vững.', 'bg': 'Надзорените модели за анализ са постигнали впечатляващи резултати върху текстовете в домейна. Въпреки това, техните изпълнения намаляват драстично при текстове извън домейна поради промяната на разпределението на данните. Споделеният и частен модел показа обещаващите си предимства за облекчаване на този проблем чрез разделяне на характеристиките, докато предишните работи обръщат повече внимание на подобряването на споделените функции, но пренебрегват задълбочената релевантност на конкретните. За да се справим с този проблем, за първи път прилагаме динамична мрежа за съвпадение на споделения частен модел за полунадзор на междудомейнен анализ на зависимост. Междувременно, като се има предвид оскъдността на данни, обозначени с целеви домейни, ние използваме необозначени данни от два аспекта, т.е. разработване на нова стратегия за обучение за подобряване на способността на мрежата за динамично съвпадение и фина настройка на BERT за получаване на контекстуализирани изображения, свързани с домейна. Експериментите с базови набори от данни показват, че предлаганият модел постоянно надминава различните базови линии, което води до нови най-съвременни резултати във всички области. Подробен анализ на различните стратегии за съвпадение показва, че е от съществено значение да се научат подходящи съвпадение тежести, за да се подчертаят полезни функции и да се игнорират безполезни или дори вредни такива. Освен това, нашият предложен модел може директно да бъде разширен до адаптация на домейна с множество източници и постига най-добри резултати сред различните базови линии, като допълнително проверява ефективността и здравината.', 'da': 'Overvågede analysemodeller har opnået imponerende resultater på domænetekster. Men deres præstationer falder drastisk på uden for domænet tekster på grund af datadistributionsskiftet. Den delte-private model har vist sine lovende fordele ved at afhjælpe dette problem via funktionsadskillelse, mens tidligere værker lægger større vægt på at forbedre fælles funktioner, men forsømmer den dybdegående relevans af specifikke. For at løse dette problem anvender vi for første gang et dynamisk matchingsnetværk på den delte-private model til semi-overvåget afhængighedsanalyse på tværs af domæner. I betragtning af manglen på måldomænemærkede data udnytter vi imidlertid ikke-mærkede data fra to aspekter, dvs. at designe en ny træningsstrategi for at forbedre kapaciteten i det dynamiske matchingsnetværk og finjustere BERT for at opnå domænerelaterede kontekstualiserede repræsentationer. Eksperimenter med benchmark datasæt viser, at vores foreslåede model konsekvent overgår forskellige basislinjer, hvilket fører til nye state-of-the-art resultater på alle domæner. Detaljeret analyse af forskellige matchende strategier viser, at det er vigtigt at lære passende matchende vægte for at understrege nyttige funktioner og ignorere ubrugelige eller endda skadelige dem. Desuden kan vores foreslåede model direkte udvides til multi-source domænetilpasning og opnår de bedste resultater blandt forskellige basislinjer, yderligere verificerer effektiviteten og robustheden.', 'hr': 'Nadzoreni modeli analize postigli su impresivni rezultati na tekstima u domenu. Međutim, njihove učinke drastično padaju na tekstove izvan domena zbog promjene distribucije podataka. Podijeljeni privatni model pokazao je svoje obećavajuće prednosti za smanjenje ovog problema putem razdvajanja karakteristika, dok prije djela obraćaju više pažnje na poboljšanje zajedničkih karakteristika, ali zanemari dubinu važnosti specifičnih. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, po prvi put primjenjujemo dinamičnu odgovarajuću mrežu na dijeljenom privatnom modelu za analizu zavisnosti polu nadzorne preko domena. U međuvremenu, s obzirom na nedostatak podataka označenih ciljnim domenom, iskorištavamo neoznačene podatke iz dva aspekta, tj. dizajnirajući novu strategiju obuke kako bi poboljšali sposobnost dinamičke odgovarajuće mreže i finalizirali BERT kako bi dobili kontekstualizirane predstave vezane za domenu. Eksperimenti na bazama podataka pokazuju da naš predloženi model konsekventno iznosi različite osnovne linije, što vodi do nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na svim domenima. Detaljna analiza o različitim odgovarajućim strategijama pokazuje da je važno naučiti odgovarajuće težine naglasiti korisne karakteristike i ignorirati beskorisne ili čak štetne. Osim toga, naš predloženi model se može izravno proširiti na adaptaciju multiizvorskih domena i ostvariti najbolje učinke među različitim osnovnim linijama, dalje provjeriti učinkovitost i snagu.', 'nl': 'Supervised parsing modellen hebben indrukwekkende resultaten behaald op in-domein teksten. Echter, hun prestaties dalen drastisch op out-of-domain teksten als gevolg van de gegevensdistributie verschuiving. Het shared-private model heeft zijn veelbelovende voordelen getoond voor het verlichten van dit probleem via kenmerkscheiding, terwijl eerdere werken meer aandacht besteden aan het verbeteren van gedeelde kenmerken, maar de diepgaande relevantie van specifieke kenmerken verwaarlozen. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, passen we voor het eerst een dynamisch matchingsnetwerk toe op het shared-private model voor semi-supervised cross-domein afhankelijkheidsparsing. Ondertussen, gezien de schaarste aan data met een doeldomein, maken we gebruik van niet-gelabelde data vanuit twee aspecten, namelijk het ontwerpen van een nieuwe trainingsstrategie om de capaciteit van het dynamische matchingsnetwerk te verbeteren en het finetunen van BERT om domeingerelateerde contextualiseerde representaties te verkrijgen. Experimenten met benchmark datasets tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model consistent presteert dan verschillende baselines, wat leidt tot nieuwe state-of-the-art resultaten op alle domeinen. Gedetailleerde analyse van verschillende matching strategieën toont aan dat het essentieel is om geschikte matching gewichten te leren om nuttige functies te benadrukken en nutteloze of zelfs schadelijke te negeren. Bovendien kan ons voorgestelde model direct worden uitgebreid tot multi-source domeinaanpassing en bereikt het beste prestaties tussen verschillende baselines, wat de effectiviteit en robuustheid verder verifieert.', 'de': 'Überwachte Parsing-Modelle haben beeindruckende Ergebnisse auf In-Domain-Texten erzielt. Aufgrund der Verschiebung der Datenverteilung sinken ihre Leistungen jedoch drastisch bei nicht domänenbezogenen Texten. Das Shared-Private-Modell hat seine vielversprechenden Vorteile gezeigt, um dieses Problem durch Merkmalsentrennung zu lindern, während frühere Arbeiten der Verbesserung gemeinsamer Merkmale mehr Aufmerksamkeit widmen, aber die tiefergehende Relevanz spezifischer vernachlässigen. Um dieses Problem zu beheben, wenden wir erstmals ein dynamisches Matching-Netzwerk auf das Shared-Private-Modell für semi-überwachte domänenübergreifende Abhängigkeitsparsing an. In Anbetracht der Knappheit von Daten mit Zieldomänenbezeichnung nutzen wir indessen ungekennzeichnete Daten aus zwei Aspekten: Entwerfen einer neuen Trainingsstrategie zur Verbesserung der Fähigkeit des dynamischen Matching-Netzwerks und Feinabstimmung von BERT, domänenbezogene kontextualisierte Darstellungen zu erhalten. Experimente an Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell durchweg verschiedene Baselines übertrifft, was zu neuen State-of-the-Art-Ergebnissen in allen Bereichen führt. Detaillierte Analysen verschiedener Matching-Strategien zeigen, dass es wichtig ist, geeignete Matching-Gewichte zu erlernen, um nützliche Features hervorzuheben und nutzlose oder sogar schädliche zu ignorieren. Außerdem kann unser vorgeschlagenes Modell direkt auf Multi-Source-Domänenanpassung erweitert werden und erzielt beste Leistungen zwischen verschiedenen Baselines, um die Effektivität und Robustheit weiter zu überprüfen.', 'ko': '감독 분석 모델은 역내 텍스트 분석에서 인상적인 성과를 거두었다.그러나 데이터 분포의 변화로 인해 역외 텍스트에서의 성능이 급격히 떨어졌다.공유 사유 모델은 특징 분리를 통해 이 문제를 완화시키는 데 큰 장점을 보였고 이전의 작업은 공유 특징을 강화하는 데 더 많은 관심을 기울였고 특정한 특징의 깊은 관련성을 무시했다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 처음으로 공유 사유 모델에 동적 일치 네트워크를 응용하여 반감독 크로스 의존 해석을 실시했다.또한 목표역 표기 데이터의 희소성을 고려하여 우리는 두 가지 측면에서 표기되지 않은 데이터, 즉 동적 매칭 네트워크의 능력을 향상시키고 BERT를 미세하게 조정하여 역과 관련된 상하문 표시를 얻는 새로운 훈련 전략을 설계했다.기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리가 제시한 모델이 시종 각종 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 보여 모든 분야에서 최신 결과를 얻었다.서로 다른 정합 전략에 대한 상세한 분석에 따르면 적당한 정합권을 배워서 유용한 특징을 강조하고 무용하거나 심지어 해로운 특징을 소홀히 하는 것이 필요하다.그 밖에 우리가 제시한 모델은 다원역 자체 적응으로 직접 확장되고 각종 기선에서 최상의 성능을 얻으며 이 모델의 유효성과 노봉성을 더욱 검증했다.', 'id': 'Model penghuraian yang diawasi telah mencapai hasil yang mengesankan pada teks dalam domain. Namun, pertunjukan mereka jatuh secara drastis pada teks luar domain karena perubahan distribusi data. Model pribadi-berbagi telah menunjukkan keuntungan yang berjanji untuk mengurangi masalah ini melalui pemisahan fitur, sementara pekerjaan sebelumnya memberi lebih perhatian untuk meningkatkan fitur-fitur berbagi tetapi mengabaikan relevansi dalam-dalam yang spesifik. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kita untuk pertama kalinya menerapkan jaringan yang cocok dinamik pada model pribadi-berbagi untuk pemeriksaan dependensi cross-domain semi-diawasi. Sementara itu, mempertimbangkan kekurangan data target-domain yang ditabel, kami menggunakan data tidak ditabel dari dua aspek, yaitu, merancang strategi latihan baru untuk meningkatkan kemampuan jaringan yang cocok dinamik dan memperbaiki BERT untuk mendapatkan representation kontekstualisasi berkaitan dengan domain. Eksperimen pada set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa model kami diusulkan secara konsisten melampaui berbagai garis dasar, yang menyebabkan hasil terbaru di semua domain. Analisis terperinci tentang strategi persamaan yang berbeda menunjukkan bahwa penting untuk belajar berat persamaan yang sesuai untuk menekankan fitur berguna dan mengabaikan yang tidak berguna atau bahkan yang berbahaya. Selain itu, model kami yang diusulkan dapat terus diperluaskan untuk adaptasi domain multi-sumber dan mencapai prestasi terbaik di antara berbagai garis dasar, mengeverifikasi lebih lanjut efektivitas dan kepekatan.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa wimbo huo wa wimbo umefanikiwa kuwa na matokeo mazuri ya maandishi ya ndani. Hata hivyo, michoro yao yanapungua kwa kiasi kikubwa kwenye maandishi yasiyo ya ndani kwa sababu ya mabadiliko ya usambazaji wa data. The shared-private model has shown its promising advantages for alleviating this problem via feature separation, whereas prior works pay more attention to enhance shared features but neglect the in-depth relevance of specific ones.  Ili kuzungumzia suala hili, kwa mara ya kwanza tunatumia mtandao wa ushirikiano wa kimapenzi kwenye muundo wa binafsi unaoendelewa kwa ajili ya kuingiza kituo cha kutegemea kwa ajili ya uchimbaji wa kimataifa. Wakati huo huo, kwa kuzingatia ukosefu wa taarifa zinazoonyesha lengo la ndani, tunatumia taarifa zisizoeleweka kutoka kwenye vipande viwili, yaani, kutengeneza mkakati mpya wa mafunzo ili kuboresha uwezo wa kuungana na mtandao wa intaneti na kutumia vizuri vya BERT ili kupata maoni yanayohusiana na ndani. Majaribio kwenye taarifa za benchmark yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu unapendekezwa kwa ujumla unafanya misingi mbalimbali, na kusababisha matokeo ya hali mpya ya sanaa kwenye maeneo yote. Uchambuzi wa kina kuhusu mikakati mbalimbali yanaonyesha kuwa ni muhimu kujifunza mizani inayofanana na mizani sahihi ili kuweka msisitizo wa manufaa na kupuuza vifaa vinavyofaa au hata vibaya. Zaidi ya hayo, muundo wetu wa pendekezo unaweza kuongezeka moja kwa moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya kuboreshwa kwa maeneo ya vyanzo vingi na kupata ufanisi bora miongoni mwa misingi mbalimbali, na pia kuthibitisha ufanisi na ubora.', 'fa': 'مدلهای تحلیل نظارت به نتیجه\u200cهای تاثیرگذاری در متن\u200cهای دامین رسیده\u200cاند. با این حال، نمایش\u200cهای آنها به دلیل تغییر تغییر تقسیم داده\u200cها در متن\u200cهای خارج از دامنه\u200cها زیادی می\u200cافتند. مدل خصوصی مشترک برای کمبود کردن این مشکل را به عنوان جدایی خصوصی نشان داده است، در حالی که کارهای قبلی به افزایش خصوصی مشترک توجه بیشتری داده می\u200cشود ولی به عنوان ارتباط عمیق خصوصی را نادیده بگیرید. برای حل این مسئله، ما برای اولین بار یک شبکه با هماهنگی دینامیک را در مدل خصوصی مشترک برای بررسی بستگی زیادی دامنه\u200cهای مرکزی تحت نظر قرار می\u200cدهیم. در ضمن، با توجه به کمبود داده های نقاشی هدف دارند، ما داده های غیرقابل استفاده از دو منطقه، یعنی طراحی استراتژی جدید آموزش برای بهبود کردن توانایی شبکه متناسب دینامیک و تنظیم BERT برای گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای متناسب به دامنه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cهایی روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ابزار نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما همیشه از خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای مختلف بیشتر است که به نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت\u200cهای هنری جدید روی همه\u200cی دامنه\u200cها می\u200cرسد. تحلیل جزئیات درباره استراتژی های متفاوت متفاوت نشان می دهد که برای یاد گرفتن وزن متفاوت مناسب برای تفصیل کردن ویژه های مفید و نادیده گرفتن ویژه های بی استفاده یا حتی آسیبی است. علاوه بر این، مدل پیشنهاد ما می تواند مستقیماً به تعادل دومین منبع زیادی تغییر داده شود و بهترین اجرای بین خطوط بنیادی\u200cهای مختلف را بررسی کند، و بیشتر تأیید فعالیت و استعداد.', 'sq': 'Modelet e analizimit të mbikqyrura kanë arritur rezultate mbresëlënëse në tekstet në domeni. Megjithatë, shfaqjet e tyre bien drastikisht në tekste jashtë domenisë për shkak të ndryshimit të shpërndarjes së të dhënave. Modeli i ndarë-privat ka treguar avantazhet e tij premtuese për lehtësimin e këtij problemi nëpërmjet ndarjes së karakteristikave, ndërsa punët e mëparshme kushtojnë më shumë vëmendje për përmirësimin e karakteristikave të përbashkëta por harrojnë rëndësinë e thellë të atyre specifike. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne për herë të parë aplikojmë një rrjet dinamik të përputhjes në modelin e ndarë-privat për analizimin e varësisë gjysmë-mbikqyrur ndër-domeni. Ndërkohë, duke konsideruar mungesën e të dhënave të etiketuara në domeni-objektiv, ne nxjerrim të dhënat e pa-etiketuar nga dy aspekte, pra, projektimin e një strategjie të re trainimi për të përmirësuar aftësinë e rrjetit dinamik të përputhjes dhe rregullimin e BERT për të marrë përfaqësime kontekstuale lidhur me domenin. Experiments on benchmark datasets show that our proposed model consistently outperforms various baselines, leading to new state-of-the-art results on all domains.  Analiza e detajuar mbi strategjitë e ndryshme të barazimit tregon se është thelbësore të mësohen pesha të përshtatshme të barazimit për të theksuar karakteristikat e dobishme dhe për të injoruar ato të padobishme apo madje të dëmshme. Përveç kësaj, modeli ynë i propozuar mund të zgjerohet drejtpërdrejt në përshtatjen e domenit me shumë burime dhe arrin rezultate më të mira midis linjave bazë të ndryshme, duke kontrolluar më tej efektshmërinë dhe forcën.', 'tr': "Supervisor hat modelleri domain textlerinde etkileşimli netijesi başarmady. Ancak, veri dağıtımı değiştirmesi nedeniyle performansları domenin dışında oldukça düşüyor. Beýleki-hususiy nusga bu meseläni aýrylşyk bilen azaltmak üçin wajyp beren zadyny görkezildi. Öňki işlerde paylaşyk özelliklerini geliştirmek üçin köp üns berýär ýöne spesifikleriň derinliklerini ýok etmäge karar berýär. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, ilkinji gezek, yarı-gözlemli cross-domain bağlılığı ayırmak üçin bir dinamik eşleşen a ğı uygulayıp geçiririz Bu arada, hedef domaýynyň etiketlenen verilerin eksikliğini düşünerek, iki aspektden, yani, dinamik e şleşen şebekeniň beceriliğini geliştirmek üçin yeni bir eğitim stratejisini tasarruf etmek üçin we BERT'i fin-tuning etmek üçin domain ile ilgili contextualized temsilleri elde etmek üçin elimize geçiriyoruz. benchmark veri setirlerinde öränler görkezilýän nusgadymyz çapda dürli basit setirlerinden çykarmady we täze möhüm sahypalarda täze möhüm bolup ýöredip ýöredip bilýär. Farklı eşleşen stratejiler barada detaylar analizi çykyş etmek üçin peýdaly çykyşlary ukyp almak üçin ýeterli çykyşlary ukyp almak üçin peýdaly däldir we hatda ýeterli çykyşlary görmezden çykarýar. Hem biziň teklip eden modelimiz birnäçe çeşme köpüsü domeny adaptasyýana direkt uzatlanabilir we çeşitli baseliniň arasynda iň gowy performanslary başaryp biler, etkinlik we güýçligini daşyryp biler.", 'af': "Ondergesien verwerking modele het inpresieële resultate op in- domein teks bereik. Maar hulle uitvoerings laat drastieke af op af-domein-teks vanweë die data verspreiding verskuif. Die gedeelde-privaat model het sy beloftende voordeel vertoon om hierdie probleem deur funksie-skeiding te verminder, terwyl voorheen werk meer aandag te betaal om gedeelde funksies te verbeter maar vergeet die in-diepte relevansie van spesifieke een. Om hierdie probleem te adres, ons vir die eerste keer toewend 'n dinamiese ooreenstemmende netwerk op die gedeelde-privaat model vir semi-superviseer kruisdomein afhanklikheid verwerking. In middeltyd, aangesien van die skaamte van die doel-domein etiketeerde data, het ons onbetekende data van twee aspekte, bv. die ontwerp van 'n nuwe onderwerking strategie om die kapasiteit van die dinamiese ooreenstemmende netwerk en fin-tuning BERT te verbeter om domein-verwante contextualiseerde voorstellings te kry. Eksperimente op benchmark datastelle vertoon dat ons voorgestelde model konsistentlik verskillende basisline uitvoer, wat na nuwe staat-van-kuns-resultate op alle domeine lei. Detaileerde analisie oor verskillende ooreenstemmende strategies bevestig dat dit behoorlik is om geskikte ooreenstemmende gewigte te leer om gebruiklike funksies te bepaal en te ignoreer gebruiklike of selfs skadelike. Ons voorgestelde model kan direk uitbrei word na multibronkode domein aanpassing en beste uitvoerings onder verskeie basisline bereik word, verder die effektiviteit en kragtigheid bevestig.", 'am': 'በዶሜን ጽሑፎች ላይ የተመሳሳይ ውጤቶች አግኝተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የዳታ አካባቢ ክፍተት ምክንያት የዶሜን ጽሑፎች በመውጣት በሙሉ ያሳርፋሉ፡፡ የተካፈሉት የግል-የግል ሞዴል የዚህን መከራ በአፍሪካ መለያየት ለመቀነስ የተስፋ ጥቅሞችን አሳይቷል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመጀመሪያ ለመጀመሪያ እና የተካፈል የግል-የግል-የግል-የግል ሞዴል ለsemi-supervised cross-domain-dependency parsing ጥያቄን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በዚህ ሰዓት፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ዳታዎችን በጭንቀት፣ ከሁለቱ ወገን ያልታወቀ ዳታዎችን እና አዲስ ተማሪ strategy እና የዲናዊ ተካሄ መረብ እና የውይይት ግንኙነት የውጤት ግንኙነቶችን ለማግኘት የBERT ስልጣንን ለመሻል እና ለመጠቀም አዲስ ትምህርት ማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የbenchmark ዳታ ማሳየት ፈተናዎች በተዘጋጀው ሞዴላዎቻችን በተለየ የብሔራዊ ደረጃዎችን እንዲያሳየፉ ያሳያል፡፡ በተለየ ልዩ ተቃውሞ ሚትሮች ላይ የተዘረዘ Analysis የሚያስፈልገው የሚጠቅሙትን ምርጫዎች እና የሚጠቅሙትን ወይም የሚጎዱትን ማስተማር ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴላያችን ወደ ብዙ-source ዶሜን ማሻሻሻል ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հետևյալ վերլուծության մոդելները բնագավառի տեքստների վրա տպավորիչ արդյունքներ են ստացել: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանց արտադրողությունները խիստ նվազում են ոչ տիեզերական տեքստերի վրա տվյալների տարածման փոփոխության պատճառով: Միացյալ-մասնավոր մոդելը ցույց է տալիս իր խոստացնող առավելությունները այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար առանձնահատկությունների բաժանման միջոցով, մինչդեռ նախկին աշխատանքները ավելի ուշադրություն են դարձնում ընդհանուր առանձնահատկությունների բարելավման համար, բայց ան Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջին անգամ կիսել ենք դինամիկ համապատասխանող ցանց կիսակառավարվող մասնավոր մոդելի վերլուծության համար: Միևնույն ժամանակ, հաշվի առնելով նպատակային բնագավառի պիտակ նշված տվյալների բացակայությունը, մենք օգտագործում ենք անպիտակ տվյալներ երկու ասպեկտներից, այսինքն՝ նոր մարզիչ ռազմավարության ձևավորման համար, որպեսզի բարելավենք դինամիկ համապատասխանող ցանցի ունակությունը և բարելավենք BER-ը բ Համեմարկ տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը մշտապես գերազանցում է տարբեր հիմնական գծերը, ինչը հանգեցնում է բոլոր ոլորտներում նոր ամենակարևոր արդյունքների: Տարբեր համապատասխանման ռազմավարությունների մանրամասն վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ անհրաժեշտ է սովորել համապատասխանող կշիռներ, որպեսզի նշենք օգտակար հատկանիշները և անտեսենք անօգտակար կամ նույնիսկ վնասավոր հատ Ավելին, մեր առաջարկված մոդելը կարող է ուղղակի ընդլայնվել բազմա աղբյուրների բնագավառի ադապտացիային և հասնել լավագույն արդյունքներին տարբեր հիմնական գծերի միջև, ավելի շատ ստուգելով արդյունավետությունը և կայունությունը:', 'bn': 'পার্সিং মডেলে ডোমেইন টেক্সটে চমৎকার ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে। তবে ডাটা বিতরণের পরিবর্তনের কারণে তাদের প্রদর্শনীরা ডোমেইনের বাইরে টেক্সটের ব্যাপারে ন্যায়াস্ত্রিকভাবে অব শেয়ার করা ব্যক্তিগত মডেল বিভাগের মাধ্যমে এই সমস্যার প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল সুবিধা কমিয়ে দেখিয়েছে, কিন্তু পূর্বে কাজ শেয়ার করা বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা প্রথমবার শেয়ার করা ব্যক্তিগত মডেলে একটি ডাইনামিক মিলিং নেটওয়ার্ক প্রয়োগ করেছি যেখানে সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা ক Meanwhile, considering the scarcity of target-domain labeled data, we leverage unlabeled data from two aspects, i.e., designing a new training strategy to improve the capability of the dynamic matching network and fine-tuning BERT to obtain domain-related contextualized representations.  বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল বিভিন্ন বেসেলাইনের বাইরে প্রদর্শন করে, যার ফলে সকল ডোমেইনে নতুন বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে মিলিয়ে যাওয়া কৌশলের ব্যাপারে যথাযথ মিলিয়ে যাওয়া ওজন শিখার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ যে ব্যবহারে এছাড়াও, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল সরাসরি বহুস্থ সোর্স ডোমেইন আবেদনের দিকে প্রস্তুত করা যাবে এবং বিভিন্ন ভেসেলাইনের মধ্যে সবচেয়ে ভালো কাজ', 'ca': "Els models d'analització supervisades han aconseguit resultats impressionants en els textos en domini. Tot i així, les seves performances cauen dràsticament en textos fora de domini a causa del canvi de distribució de dades. El model compartit-privat ha demostrat les seves avantatges prometedores per aliviar aquest problema a través de la separació de característiques, mentre que treballs anteriors prestan més atenció a millorar característiques compartides però ignoren la pertinencia profunda de determinats. Per abordar aquest problema, aplicam per primera vegada una xarxa dinàmica de comparació en el model compartit-privat per a l'analització de la dependencia transdomínica semisupervisada. Mentrestant, tenint en compte la escassetat de dades etiquetades en dominis d'objectiu, aprofitem dades no etiquetades de dos aspectes, és a dir, dissenyar una nova estratègia de formació per millorar la capacitat de la xarxa dinàmica de comparació i ajustar BERT per obtenir representacions contextualitzades relacionades amb dominis. Els experiments en conjunts de dades de referència demostren que el nostre model proposat supera constantment diverses línies de base, portant a nous resultats més avançats en tots els dominis. Una anàlisi detallada sobre diferents estratègies de comparació demostra que és essencial aprendre pes adequats de comparació per enfatizar les característiques útils i ignorar les inútils o fins i tot nocives. A més, el nostre model proposat es pot estendre directament a l'adaptació de dominis de múltiples fonts i aconsegueix millors resultats entre diverses línies de base, verificant més l'eficacia i la robustet.", 'cs': 'Sledované parsovací modely dosáhly působivých výsledků na textech v doméně. Nicméně jejich výkon drasticky klesá na mimo doménu texty v důsledku posunu distribuce dat. Sdílený a soukromý model ukázal své slibné výhody pro zmírnění tohoto problému prostřednictvím oddělení vlastností, zatímco předchozí práce věnují větší pozornost posílení sdílených vlastností, ale zanedbávají hloubkovou relevanci konkrétních vlastností. Abychom tento problém vyřešili, poprvé aplikujeme dynamickou síť pro analýzu závislostí mezi doménami pod částečným dohledem na sdíleném a soukromém modelu. Mezitím s ohledem na nedostatek dat označených cílovou doménou využíváme neznačená data ze dvou aspektů, tj. navrhování nové tréninkové strategie pro zlepšení schopnosti dynamické sítě přiřazování a jemné ladění BERT pro získání kontextualizovaných reprezentací souvisejících s doménou. Experimenty na referenčních datových sadách ukazují, že náš navrhovaný model konzistentně překonává různé základní linie, což vede k novým nejmodernějším výsledkům ve všech oblastech. Podrobná analýza různých strategií shodování ukazuje, že je nezbytné se naučit vhodné shodovací váhy pro zdůraznění užitečných funkcí a ignorování zbytečných nebo dokonce škodlivých. Navíc náš navržený model lze přímo rozšířit na adaptaci více zdrojů domén a dosahovat nejlepších výkonů mezi různými základními liniemi, dále ověřovat efektivitu a robustnost.', 'et': 'Järelevalvega parsimismudelid on saavutanud domeenisiseste tekstide puhul muljetavaldavaid tulemusi. Andmete jaotuse muutuse tõttu langevad nende esitused aga märkimisväärselt domeeniväliste tekstide puhul. Ühise ja erasektori mudel on näidanud oma paljutõotavaid eeliseid selle probleemi leevendamisel funktsioonide eraldamise kaudu, samas kui varasemates töödes pööratakse rohkem tähelepanu ühiste funktsioonide täiustamisele, kuid jäetakse tähelepanuta konkreetsete omaduste põhjalikku asjakohasust. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks rakendame esmakordselt dünaamilise sobitamise võrgu jagatud-privaatsele mudelile pooljärelevalvega valdkondadevahelise sõltuvuse parsimiseks. Samal ajal, arvestades sihtdomeeni märgistatud andmete nappust, kasutame märgistamata andmeid kahest aspektist, st töötame välja uue koolitusstrateegia, et parandada dünaamilise sobitamise võrgu võimekust ja täpsustame BERTi domeeniga seotud kontekstiliste esituste saamiseks. Võrdlusandmekogumitega seotud katsed näitavad, et meie pakutud mudel on järjekindlalt erinevatest lähtejoontest kõrgem, mis toob kaasa uued tipptasemel tulemused kõigis valdkondades. Erinevate sobitamisstrateegiate üksikasjalik analüüs näitab, et on oluline õppida sobivaid kaalusid, et rõhutada kasulikke omadusi ja ignoreerida kasutuid või isegi kahjulikke. Lisaks saab meie kavandatud mudelit laiendada otseselt mitme allika valdkonna kohandamisele ja saavutada parimad tulemused erinevate lähtejoonte vahel, kontrollides veelgi efektiivsust ja vastupidavust.', 'fi': 'Valvotut jäsennysmallit ovat saavuttaneet vaikuttavia tuloksia verkkotunnusten tekstien osalta. Niiden suorituskyky laskee kuitenkin rajusti verkkotunnuksen ulkopuolisissa teksteissä datan jakautumisen muutoksen vuoksi. Yhteisen ja yksityisen sektorin malli on osoittanut lupaavan etunsa ongelman lievittämisessä ominaisuuserottelun avulla, kun taas aiemmissa teoksissa kiinnitetään enemmän huomiota yhteisten ominaisuuksien parantamiseen mutta jätetään huomiotta tiettyjen ominaisuuksien syvällinen merkitys. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi käytämme ensimmäistä kertaa dynaamista vastaavuusverkkoa jaetun ja yksityisen mallin puolivalvottuun toimialueiden välisen riippuvuuden jäsentämiseen. Kun otetaan huomioon kohdeverkkotunnuksella merkityn datan niukkuus, hyödynnämme merkitsemätöntä dataa kahdesta näkökulmasta, eli suunnittelemme uuden koulutusstrategian dynaamisen matching-verkoston valmiuksien parantamiseksi ja hienosäätämme BERT:tä verkkotunnuksiin liittyvien kontekstualisoitujen esitysten saamiseksi. Vertailutietoaineistojen kokeilut osoittavat, että ehdotettu mallimme suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti eri lähtölinjoja paremmin, mikä johtaa uusimpiin tuloksiin kaikilla toimialoilla. Eri täsmäytysstrategioiden yksityiskohtainen analyysi osoittaa, että on tärkeää oppia sopivat täsmäpainot korostamaan hyödyllisiä ominaisuuksia ja sivuuttamaan hyödyttömät tai jopa haitalliset. Lisäksi ehdotettu malli voidaan laajentaa suoraan monilähdesovellutukseen ja saavuttaa parhaat tulokset eri lähtölinjojen välillä, mikä lisää tehokkuutta ja kestävyyttä.', 'bs': 'Nadzorni modeli analize postigli su impresivni rezultati na tekstima u domenu. Međutim, njihove izvode drastično padaju na tekstove izvan domena zbog promjene distribucije podataka. Podijeljeni privatni model pokazao je svoje obećavajuće prednosti za ublažavanje ovog problema putem razdvajanja karakteristika, dok prije djela obraća više pažnje na poboljšanje zajedničkih karakteristika, ali zanemari dubinu relevantnosti specifičnih. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, prvi put primjenjujemo dinamičnu mrežu odgovarajućeg na dijeljenom privatnom modelu za analizu ovisnosti o polu-nadzornom krstodomenu. U međuvremenu, s obzirom na nedostatak podataka označenih ciljnim domenom, iskorištavamo nezabelirane podatke iz dva aspekta, tj. dizajnirajući novu strategiju obuke kako bi poboljšali sposobnost dinamične odgovarajuće mreže i finalizirali BERT kako bi dobili kontekstualizirane predstave vezane za domenu. Eksperimenti na bazama podataka pokazuju da naš predloženi model konsekventno iznosi različite osnovne linije, što vodi do nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na svim domenima. Detaljna analiza o različitim odgovarajućim strategijama pokazuje da je važno naučiti odgovarajuće težine naglasiti korisne karakteristike i ignorirati beskorisne ili čak štetne. Osim toga, naš predloženi model se može direktno proširiti na adaptaciju multiizvorskih domena i ostvariti najbolje učinke među različitim osnovnim linijama, dalje provjeriti učinkovitost i jačanost.', 'az': "Supervised parsing models have achieved impressive results on domain texts. Lakin, onların performansları məlumatların dağıtım dağıtımı dəyişikliyinə görə dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərinə düşür. Bölünən xüsusi modeli bu problemi fərqli ayrılıq vasitəsilə əskiltmək üçün və ’ d verən faydalarını göstərdi. Halbuki əvvəlki işlər paylaşılan fərqli fərqli artırmaq üçün daha çox pay verirlər, amma xüsusi fərqli fərqli olanların derinliklərini unutmayın. Bu məsələni çəkmək üçün ilk dəfə, yarı-gözləyirli çox domain bağımlılığı ayırmaq üçün paylaşılmış xüsusi modeli ilə dinamik şəbəkə uygulayıq. Bu arada, məqsədilə etiketlənmiş məlumatların zəif olmasını düşünürək, iki aspektdən etiketlənmiş məlumatları, məqsədilə yeni təhsil stratejisini təhsil etmək üçün dinamik müəyyən şəbəkənin və BERT'nin düzgün təhsil etmək üçün domain ilə müxtəlif təhsil edilməsi üçün istifadə etmək üçün yeni təhsil stratejisini təhsil edirik. Benchmark verilənlərin sınaqları göstərir ki, təklif etdiyimiz modellərin müxtəlif təklif sətirlərindən daha çox üstün olduğunu göstərir, bütün domenin yeni məlumatın sonuçlarına yol açar. Müxtəlif uyğunlaşan stratejilər barəsindəki detalı analizi istifadə edir ki, istifadə edən və hətta zərər verənlərdən öyrənmək üçün uyğun uyğunluq ağırlığını öyrənmək və faydalanmayan və hətta zərər verənlərdən öyrənmək məqsədildir. Əksinə, bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz çoxlu mənbə domeinin adaptasiyasına doğrudan uzaqlaşdırıla bilər və müxtəlif sətir arasında ən gözəl performanslar yetişirə bilər, efektivitəti və güclüyü daha çox təsdiqləyərlər.", 'jv': '<control><shift>U Last.fm Attribute To Address this question, we for the first time use a dynamics match network on the share-Personal model for semi-super-visited inter-domain diphensible PASSing. The same is true for example. User: Detalé Yo wis tambah, padha nambah model sing bisa nyeleh dadi tanggal multi-source domain adalah karo iso nggawe barang sing luwih apik sing kalagayaan di sistem sing sampeyan, bisa ngupakan efek karo scêpakan.', 'sk': 'Nadzorovani modeli razčlenjanja so dosegli impresivne rezultate na domenskih besedilih. Vendar pa se njihova uspešnost drastično zmanjšuje pri besedilih zunaj domene zaradi premika porazdelitve podatkov. Deljeno-zasebni model je pokazal obetavne prednosti za lajšanje tega problema z ločevanjem značilnosti, medtem ko so predhodna dela več pozornosti namenjena izboljšanju skupnih značilnosti, vendar zanemarjajo poglobljeno pomembnost posameznih. Za reševanje te težave prvič uporabljamo dinamično ujemajoče omrežje v skupnem in zasebnem modelu za delno nadzorovano razčlenitev meddomenske odvisnosti. Ob upoštevanju pomanjkanja podatkov, označenih s ciljno domeno, izkoriščamo neoznačene podatke iz dveh vidikov, tj. oblikovanje nove strategije usposabljanja za izboljšanje zmogljivosti dinamičnega ujemanja mreže in natančno nastavitev BERT za pridobivanje kontekstualiziranih predstavitev, povezanih z domeno. Poskusi na referenčnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da naš predlagani model dosledno presega različne osnovne vrstice, kar vodi do novih najsodobnejših rezultatov na vseh področjih. Podrobna analiza različnih strategij ujemanja kaže, da je bistveno, da se naučite ustreznih ujemanja uteži, da poudarite uporabne funkcije in ignorirate neuporabne ali celo škodljive. Poleg tega je naš predlagani model mogoče neposredno razširiti na prilagoditev več virov domen in doseči najboljše učinkovitosti med različnimi osnovnimi linijami ter nadalje preverjati učinkovitost in robustnost.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Kayya, musamman da suka kashe matsayin da aka fito-don-komai, sabo da shige ga gafakan data. @ info: whatsthis Domin ka yi amfani da wannan masu husũma, za mu yi amfani da zanen wani zane mai daidaita kan shirin-bayani na farkon zaman a yi amfani da shi a kan parse masu tsari na-ɗabi'a da aka yi bincike. Aka sami, kuma, idan an sami tsarin bayanin-Domen da aka rubũta shi, sai mu cika data wanda ba'a rubũta ba daga duk biyu, misali, yana design wani zantaraki na gyarar abincin da za'a daidaita mitandanin da ke daidaita da shi kuma tuna mai kyau-tune BERT dõmin ka sami wakilishi masu da ke husũma na guda. Fijaroyi kan danne-bangon ayuka na nuna cewa misalinmu wanda aka buƙata yana iya ƙaranci kodi, yana ƙara zuwa matsalar-state-the-art kan duk Domen. Ana ƙayyade Bayani a kan taki masu daidaita ko kuma, ana nuna cewa, ana da muhimu a karanta nau'i masu daidai dõmin ya ƙayyade haske masu amfani da amfani da kuma ka ƙyale masu amfani da ba ko kuma don ya iya cũtar da masu yiwuwa. Babu, za'a iya shimfiɗa misalinmu dira zuwa adadin sauri-wuri masu yawa kuma ya isa mafiya kyauta a tsakanin misalin daban-daban, kuma yana ƙara gaskata masu amfani da tufãfin.", 'he': 'דוגמני מעבדה משגיחים השיגו תוצאות מרשים על טקסטים בתחום. עם זאת, ההופעות שלהם נופלות באופן דרסטי על טקסטים מחוץ לתחום בגלל שינוי ההפצה של נתונים. המודל הפרטי המשותף הראה את היתרונות המבטיחות שלו כדי להקל על הבעיה הזאת באמצעות הפרדת תכונות, בעוד שעבודות קודמות מקבלות יותר תשומת לב כדי לשפר תכונות משותפים אבל להזנח את רלוונטיות עמוקה של תכונות ספציפיות. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו בפעם הראשונה להפעיל רשת התאמה דינמית על המודל הפרטי המשותף למחקר תלויות בין שטחים חצי שולטים. בינתיים, בהתחשב בניעוד של נתונים עם תווים בתחום המטרה, אנו משתמשים בנתונים ללא תווים משני היבטים, כלומר, עיצוב אסטרטגיה לאימון חדשה כדי לשפר את היכולת של רשת התאמה הדינמית ולהגדיר את BERT כדי להשיג מייצגים קונטוקטואליזציונים קשורים לתחום. ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים של רמזים מראים שהמודל המוצע שלנו עולה באופן קבוע מעל שורות בסיסים שונות, מה שמוביל לתוצאות חדשות מתקדמות בכל התחומים. Detailed analysis on different matching strategies demonstrates that it is essential to learn suitable matching weights to emphasize useful features and ignore useless or even harmful ones.  חוץ מזה, המודל המוצע שלנו יכול להירחב ישירות לתאמה בתחום ממקורים רבים ולהשיג את ההופעות הטובות ביותר בין שורות בסיסים שונים, לאמת נוספת את היעילות וחזקה.', 'bo': 'Supervised parsing models have achieved impressive results on in-domain texts. However, their performances drop drastically on out-of-domain texts due to the data distribution shift. due to the data distribution shift. The shared-private model has shown its promising advantages for alleviating this problem via feature separation, whereas prior works pay more attention to enhance shared features but neglect the in-depth relevance of specific ones. To address this issue, we for the first time apply a dynamic matching network on the shared-private model for semi-supervised cross-domain dependency parsing. Meanwhile, considering the scarcity of target-domain labeled data, we leverage unlabeled data from two aspects, i.e., designing a new training strategy to improve the capability of the dynamic matching network and fine-tuning BERT to obtain domain-related contextualized representations. Experiments on benchmark datasets show that our proposed model consistently outperforms various baselines, leading to new state-of-the-art results on all domains. Detailed analysis on different matching strategies demonstrates that it is essential to learn suitable matching weights to emphasize useful features and ignore useless or even harmful ones. དེ་ལས། ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབུགས་ནི་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་གྱིས་སྣ་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན'}
{'en': 'Contextual Fine-to-Coarse Distillation for Coarse-grained Response Selection in Open-Domain Conversations', 'fr': 'Regardons de plus près la façon dont le réglage précis change {BERT}', 'ar': 'نظرة عن كثب على كيفية صقل التغييرات {برت}', 'es': 'Una mirada más cercana a cómo cambia el ajuste fino {BERT}', 'pt': 'Uma visão mais detalhada de como o ajuste fino muda {BERT}', 'ja': '微調整の方法{BERT}を詳しく見る', 'zh': '详知微调何以变化 {BERT}', 'hi': 'कैसे ठीक ट्यूनिंग परिवर्तन {BERT} पर एक करीब देखो', 'ru': 'Более пристальный взгляд на то, как тонкая настройка меняется {BERT}', 'ga': 'Súil Níos Géire ar Mar a Athraíonn Mionchoigeartú {BERT}', 'ka': 'დახურებელი შეხედვით როგორ სწორი შეცვლა {BERT}', 'el': 'Μια πιο προσεκτική ματιά στο πώς αλλάζει ο συντονισμός {BERT}', 'hu': 'Közelebbről megvizsgáljuk, hogyan változik finomhangolás {BERT}', 'kk': 'Жабушы {BERT} өзгерістерін қалай баптауға қараңыз', 'lt': 'Atidžiau pažiūrėkite, kaip koreguojami pokyčiai {BERT}', 'it': 'Uno sguardo più attento su come regolare le modifiche {BERT}', 'mk': 'Поблиску погледнете како се променуваат фините промени {BERT}', 'mt': 'Ħarsa aktar mill-qrib lejn Kif Tibdil fl-A ġġustament Irfinat {BERT}', 'ms': 'Lihat lebih dekat bagaimana Penyesuaian Perubahan {BERT}', 'mn': 'Хэрэв сайн тохируулах өөрчлөлтийг хараад {BERT}', 'ml': 'ഒരു അടുത്തുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയെന്ന് നോക്കുക', 'pl': 'Bliższe spojrzenie na to, jak zmienia się dostrajanie {BERT}', 'ro': 'O privire mai atentă asupra modului în care modificările de reglare fină {BERT}', 'no': 'Name', 'si': 'වහලා බලන්න කොහොමද හොඳ සංවේදනය වෙනස් වෙන්නේ {BERT}', 'sr': 'Pogledaj kako se dobra prilagodba mijenja.', 'so': 'A Closer Look How Fine-tuning Changes {BERT}', 'ur': 'اچھا تغییر کیسے اچھا تغییر دیتا ہے؟', 'sv': 'En närmare titt på hur finjustering av ändringar {BERT}', 'ta': 'A closer look at how good- tuning changes {BERT}', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhìn gần hơn xem Thay đổi độ fine', 'bg': 'По-отблизо погледнете как се променя фината настройка', 'hr': 'Pogledaj kako se dobra prilagodba mijenja {BERT}', 'nl': 'Een nadere blik op hoe fine-tuning verandert {BERT}', 'da': 'Et nærmere kig på, hvordan finjustering ændrer sig {BERT}', 'de': 'Ein genauerer Blick darauf, wie sich das Feintuning verändert {BERT}', 'ko': '마이크로스피커가 어떻게 바뀌는지 자세히 관찰 {BERT}', 'fa': 'یک نگاه نزدیکتر به چگونه تغییرات خوب تنظیم می\u200cکند', 'id': 'Lihat lebih dekat bagaimana Penyesuaian Perubahan {BERT}', 'sw': 'Tazama jinsi mabadiliko yanavyobadilika vizuri {BERT}', 'tr': 'Baglançy Eýikleýän üýtgewleri Görkez {BERT}', 'af': "'n Closer Kyk na hoe Fine-tuning verander {BERT}", 'sq': 'A Closer Look at How Fine-tuning Changes {BERT}', 'am': 'view-zoom-action', 'hy': 'Ավելի ուշադիր նայեք, թե ինչպես են փոփոխությունները կատարվում', 'az': 'Yaxınlaşdırıcı Görün {BERT} Nə gözəl düzəltmə dəyişiklikləri', 'bn': 'কাছাকাছি দেখুন কিভাবে ভালো টুইটিং পরিবর্তন (_BERT)', 'ca': 'Una mirada més atenta a com canvien els ajustes {BERT}', 'cs': 'Bližší pohled na to, jak se mění jemné ladění {BERT}', 'bs': 'Pogledaj kako se dobra prilagodba mijenja.', 'et': 'Täpsemalt vaadata, kuidas peenhäälestus muutub {BERT}', 'fi': 'Tarkempi katsaus siihen, miten hienosäätö muuttuu {BERT}', 'jv': 'Closer Delah Peteh Fine-tuning Change {BERT}', 'sk': 'Podrobnejši pogled na spremembe finega nastavitve {BERT}', 'ha': '@ action: inmenu', 'he': 'תסתכל מקרוב יותר על איך שינויים מתאימים {BERT}', 'bo': 'Closer Look How Fine-tuning Changes {BERT}'}
{'en': 'We study the problem of coarse-grained response selection in retrieval-based dialogue systems. The problem is equally important with fine-grained response selection, but is less explored in existing literature. In this paper, we propose a Contextual Fine-to-Coarse (CFC) distilled model for coarse-grained response selection in open-domain conversations. In our CFC model, dense representations of query, candidate contexts and responses is learned based on the multi-tower architecture using contextual matching, and richer knowledge learned from the one-tower architecture (fine-grained) is distilled into the multi-tower architecture (coarse-grained) to enhance the performance of the retriever. To evaluate the performance of the proposed model, we construct two new datasets based on the Reddit comments dump and Twitter corpus. Extensive experimental results on the two datasets show that the proposed method achieves huge improvement over all evaluation metrics compared with traditional baseline methods.', 'ar': "نظرًا لانتشار التمثيلات السياقية المدربة مسبقًا في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية اليوم ، كانت هناك العديد من الجهود لفهم ماهية المعلومات التي تحتوي عليها ، ولماذا تبدو ناجحة عالميًا. تتضمن الطريقة الأكثر شيوعًا لاستخدام هذه التمثيلات ضبطها لمهمة نهائية. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم دراسة كيفية تغيير الضبط الدقيق لمساحة التضمين الأساسية. في هذا العمل ، ندرس عائلة BERT الإنجليزية ونستخدم طريقتين للتحقيق لتحليل كيفية تغيير الضبط الدقيق للمساحة. نفترض أن الضبط الدقيق يؤثر على أداء التصنيف من خلال زيادة المسافات بين الأمثلة المرتبطة بالتسميات المختلفة. نؤكد هذه الفرضية من خلال تجارب مصممة بعناية على خمس مهام مختلفة في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. من خلال هذه التجارب ، نكتشف أيضًا استثناءً للحكمة السائدة بأن `` الضبط الدقيق يحسن الأداء دائمًا ''. أخيرًا ، بمقارنة التمثيلات قبل الضبط الدقيق وبعده ، نكتشف أن الضبط الدقيق لا يُدخل تغييرات عشوائية على التمثيلات ؛ بدلاً من ذلك ، يقوم بضبط التمثيلات على المهام النهائية مع الحفاظ إلى حد كبير على الهيكل المكاني الأصلي لنقاط البيانات.", 'fr': "Compte tenu de la prévalence des représentations contextualisées pré-entraînées dans la PNL d'aujourd'hui, de nombreux efforts ont été déployés pour comprendre quelles informations elles contiennent et pourquoi elles semblent avoir un succès universel. L'approche la plus courante pour utiliser ces représentations consiste à les affiner pour une tâche finale. Pourtant, la façon dont le réglage fin modifie l'espace d'intégration sous-jacent est moins étudiée. Dans ce travail, nous étudions la famille BERT anglaise et utilisons deux techniques de palpage pour analyser comment le réglage fin modifie l'espace. Nous émettons l'hypothèse que le réglage fin affecte les performances de classification en augmentant les distances entre les exemples associés à différentes étiquettes. Nous confirmons cette hypothèse par des expériences soigneusement conçues sur cinq tâches de PNL différentes. Grâce à ces expériences, nous découvrons également une exception à la croyance dominante selon laquelle «\xa0le réglage fin améliore toujours les performances\xa0». Enfin, en comparant les représentations avant et après le réglage fin, nous découvrons que le réglage fin n'introduit pas de changements arbitraires dans les représentations\xa0; au contraire, il ajuste les représentations aux tâches en aval tout en préservant largement la structure spatiale d'origine des points de données.", 'pt': 'Dada a prevalência de representações contextualizadas pré-treinadas na PNL de hoje, tem havido muitos esforços para entender quais informações elas contêm e por que elas parecem ser universalmente bem-sucedidas. A abordagem mais comum para usar essas representações envolve ajustá-las para uma tarefa final. No entanto, como o ajuste fino altera o espaço de incorporação subjacente é menos estudado. Neste trabalho, estudamos a família inglesa BERT e usamos duas técnicas de sondagem para analisar como o ajuste fino altera o espaço. Nossa hipótese é que o ajuste fino afeta o desempenho da classificação aumentando as distâncias entre os exemplos associados a diferentes rótulos. Confirmamos essa hipótese com experimentos cuidadosamente planejados em cinco tarefas diferentes de PNL. Por meio desses experimentos, também descobrimos uma exceção à sabedoria predominante de que "o ajuste fino sempre melhora o desempenho". Finalmente, comparando as representações antes e depois do ajuste fino, descobrimos que o ajuste fino não introduz mudanças arbitrárias nas representações; em vez disso, ele ajusta as representações para tarefas downstream enquanto preserva amplamente a estrutura espacial original dos pontos de dados.', 'es': 'Dada la prevalencia de representaciones contextualizadas previamente entrenadas en la PNL actual, se han realizado muchos esfuerzos para comprender qué información contienen y por qué parecen tener éxito universal. El enfoque más común para usar estas representaciones implica ajustarlas para una tarea final. Sin embargo, se estudia menos cómo el ajuste fino cambia el espacio de incrustación subyacente. En este trabajo, estudiamos la familia BERT inglesa y utilizamos dos técnicas de sondeo para analizar cómo el ajuste fino cambia el espacio. Presumimos que el ajuste fino afecta el rendimiento de la clasificación al aumentar las distancias entre los ejemplos asociados con diferentes etiquetas. Confirmamos esta hipótesis con experimentos cuidadosamente diseñados en cinco tareas diferentes de PNL. A través de estos experimentos, también descubrimos una excepción a la sabiduría predominante de que «el ajuste fino siempre mejora el rendimiento». Finalmente, al comparar las representaciones antes y después del ajuste fino, descubrimos que el ajuste fino no introduce cambios arbitrarios en las representaciones; en cambio, ajusta las representaciones a las tareas posteriores al tiempo que preserva en gran medida la estructura espacial original de los puntos de datos.', 'ja': '今日のNLPでは、事前に訓練された文脈化された表現が普及していることを考えると、それらがどのような情報を含んでいるのか、そしてなぜそれらが普遍的に成功しているように見えるのかを理解するために多くの努力がなされてきた。 これらの表現を使用するための最も一般的なアプローチは、エンドタスクのためにそれらを微調整することです。 しかし、微調整が基礎となる埋め込み空間をどのように変化させるかは、あまり研究されていない。 この研究では、イギリスのBERTファミリーを研究し、2つのプロービング技術を使用して、微調整が空間をどのように変化させるかを分析します。 微調整は、異なるラベルに関連付けられた例間の距離を増加させることによって分類パフォーマンスに影響を与えると仮定します。 私たちは、この仮説を、5つの異なるNLPタスクに関する慎重に設計された実験で確認します。 これらの実験を通じて、私たちは「微調整は常にパフォーマンスを向上させる」という普遍的な知恵の例外も発見しました。 最後に、微調整の前後の表現を比較することにより、微調整が表現に任意の変更を導入しないことを発見します。代わりに、データポイントの元の空間構造をほぼ維持しながら、下流のタスクに表現を調整します。', 'zh': '鉴于当今之NLP,豫练之情普遍存在,已多力以知其所包,及其似遍成功。 用此最常法及针最终任务微调之。 然微调何以易底嵌空者较少。 于此之事,吾究英语BERT家,并用二术,以析微调。 设微调以增异标者示例相去以妨分类。 以五NLP精心设计实验证之。 以此实验之,犹得一遍论,曰"微调常能崇性能"。 最后,较微前后,见微调不入。 反此者,将制图为下务,而存数端于大空间结构。', 'hi': 'आज के एनएलपी में पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व के प्रसार को देखते हुए, यह समझने के लिए कई प्रयास किए गए हैं कि उनमें कौन सी जानकारी है, और वे सार्वभौमिक रूप से सफल क्यों लगते हैं। इन अभ्यावेदनों का उपयोग करने के लिए सबसे आम दृष्टिकोण में उन्हें एक अंत कार्य के लिए ठीक-ट्यूनिंग करना शामिल है। फिर भी, कैसे ठीक ट्यूनिंग अंतर्निहित एम्बेडिंग अंतरिक्ष को बदलता है, इसका कम अध्ययन किया जाता है। इस काम में, हम अंग्रेजी BERT परिवार का अध्ययन करते हैं और यह विश्लेषण करने के लिए दो जांच तकनीकों का उपयोग करते हैं कि ठीक-ट्यूनिंग अंतरिक्ष को कैसे बदलती है। हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि ठीक-ट्यूनिंग विभिन्न लेबलों से जुड़े उदाहरणों के बीच की दूरी बढ़ाकर वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन को प्रभावित करती है। हम पांच अलग-अलग एनएलपी कार्यों पर सावधानीपूर्वक डिज़ाइन किए गए प्रयोगों के साथ इस परिकल्पना की पुष्टि करते हैं। इन प्रयोगों के माध्यम से, हम प्रचलित ज्ञान के लिए एक अपवाद की भी खोज करते हैं कि "ठीक-ट्यूनिंग हमेशा प्रदर्शन में सुधार करती है"। अंत में, ठीक-ट्यूनिंग से पहले और बाद में अभ्यावेदन की तुलना करके, हमें पता चलता है कि ठीक-ट्यूनिंग प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए मनमाने ढंग से परिवर्तन पेश नहीं करता है; इसके बजाय, यह डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए अभ्यावेदन को समायोजित करता है, जबकि काफी हद तक डेटा बिंदुओं की मूल स्थानिक संरचना को संरक्षित करता है।', 'ru': 'Учитывая распространенность предварительно обученных контекстуализированных представлений в сегодняшней NLP, было предпринято много усилий, чтобы понять, какая информация в них содержится и почему они кажутся универсально успешными. Наиболее распространенный подход к использованию этих представлений заключается в их точной настройке для конечной задачи. Тем не менее, то, как точная настройка изменяет лежащее в основе пространство вложений, изучается реже. В этой работе мы изучаем английское семейство BERT и используем два зондирующих метода для анализа того, как точная настройка изменяет пространство. Мы предполагаем, что точная настройка влияет на эффективность классификации, увеличивая расстояния между примерами, связанными с различными метками. Мы подтверждаем эту гипотезу тщательно разработанными экспериментами по пяти различным задачам NLP. С помощью этих экспериментов мы также обнаруживаем исключение из преобладающей мудрости, что «тонкая настройка всегда улучшает производительность». Наконец, сравнивая представления до и после тонкой настройки, мы обнаруживаем, что тонкая настройка не вносит произвольных изменений в представления; вместо этого она корректирует представления к задачам ниже по потоку, в то же время в значительной степени сохраняя первоначальную пространственную структуру точек данных.', 'ga': "I bhfianaise leitheadúlacht na n-uiríll comhthéacsaithe réamhoilte i NLP an lae inniu, rinneadh go leor iarrachtaí chun a thuiscint cén t-eolas atá iontu, agus cén fáth go bhfuil an chuma orthu go n-éiríonn leo go huilíoch. Is é an cur chuige is coitianta chun na léirithe seo a úsáid ná iad a mhionchoigeartú le haghaidh tasc deiridh. Mar sin féin, is lú staidéar a dhéantar ar an gcaoi a n-athraíonn an mionchoigeartú ar an mbunspás leabaithe. Sa saothar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar theaghlach BERT Béarla agus úsáidimid dhá theicníc iniúchta chun anailís a dhéanamh ar an gcaoi a n-athraíonn mionchoigeartú an spás. Tugaimid hipitéis go mbíonn tionchar ag mionchoigeartú ar fheidhmíocht aicmithe trí na faid idir samplaí a bhaineann le lipéid éagsúla a mhéadú. Deimhnímid an hipitéis seo le turgnaimh deartha go cúramach ar chúig thasc éagsúla NLP. Trí na turgnaimh seo, aimsímid freisin eisceacht don ghaois atá i réim go ``feabhsaítear an fheidhmíocht i gcónaí le mionchoigeartú''. Ar deireadh, trí chomparáid a dhéanamh idir na huiríll roimh mhionchoigeartú agus ina dhiaidh, feicimid nach dtugann mionchoigeartú athruithe treallach ar léiriúcháin; ina ionad sin, déanann sé na huiríll a choigeartú go tascanna iartheachtacha agus ag an am céanna ag caomhnú bunstruchtúr spáis na bpointí sonraí.", 'el': 'Δεδομένης της επικράτησης των προ-εκπαιδευμένων αναπαραστάσεων στο σημερινό ΝΛΠ, έχουν γίνει πολλές προσπάθειες για να κατανοήσουμε ποιες πληροφορίες περιέχουν και γιατί φαίνεται να είναι παγκοσμίως επιτυχημένες. Η πιο κοινή προσέγγιση για τη χρήση αυτών των αναπαραστάσεων περιλαμβάνει τον συντονισμό τους για μια τελική εργασία. Ωστόσο, το πώς ο συντονισμός αλλάζει τον υποκείμενο χώρο ενσωμάτωσης είναι λιγότερο μελετημένο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε την αγγλική οικογένεια και χρησιμοποιούμε δύο τεχνικές ανίχνευσης για να αναλύσουμε πώς ο συντονισμός αλλάζει το χώρο. Υποθέτουμε ότι ο συντονισμός επηρεάζει την απόδοση ταξινόμησης αυξάνοντας τις αποστάσεις μεταξύ παραδειγμάτων που σχετίζονται με διαφορετικές ετικέτες. Επιβεβαιώνουμε αυτή την υπόθεση με προσεκτικά σχεδιασμένα πειράματα σε πέντε διαφορετικές εργασίες. Μέσα από αυτά τα πειράματα, ανακαλύπτουμε επίσης μια εξαίρεση στην επικρατούσα σοφία ότι ο "λεπτός συντονισμός πάντα βελτιώνει την απόδοση". Τέλος, συγκρίνοντας τις αναπαραστάσεις πριν και μετά τον συντονισμό, ανακαλύπτουμε ότι ο συντονισμός δεν εισάγει αυθαίρετες αλλαγές στις αναπαραστάσεις. Αντίθετα, προσαρμόζει τις αναπαραστάσεις σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες διατηρώντας σε μεγάλο βαθμό την αρχική χωρική δομή των σημείων δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'Tekintettel az előre képzett kontextuális reprezentációk előfordulására a mai NLP-ben, sok erőfeszítés történt annak megértésére, hogy milyen információkat tartalmaznak, és miért tűnnek egyetemes sikernek. Az ilyen reprezentációk használatának leggyakoribb megközelítése a végső feladathoz való finomhangolásuk. Mégis kevésbé tanulmányozzák, hogy a finomhangolás hogyan változtatja meg a mögöttes beágyazási tér. Ebben a munkában az angol BERT családot tanulmányozzuk, és két mérési technikát használunk annak elemzésére, hogy a finomhangolás hogyan változtatja meg a teret. Feltételezzük, hogy a finomhangolás befolyásolja az osztályozás teljesítményét azáltal, hogy növeli a különböző címkékhez kapcsolódó példák közötti távolságot. Ezt a hipotézist öt különböző NLP feladaton végzett gondosan megtervezett kísérletekkel erősítjük meg. Ezekkel a kísérletekkel kivételt fedezünk fel az uralkodó bölcsesség alól is, hogy a finomhangolás mindig javítja a teljesítményt. Végül a finomhangolás előtti és utáni reprezentációk összehasonlításával kiderül, hogy a finomhangolás nem vezet be önkényes változásokat a reprezentációkban; Ehelyett a reprezentációkat a downstream feladatokhoz igazítja, miközben nagyrészt megőrzi az adatpontok eredeti térbeli struktúráját.', 'it': "Data la prevalenza di rappresentazioni contestualizzate pre-addestrate nell'attuale PNL, ci sono stati molti sforzi per capire quali informazioni contengono e perché sembrano avere successo universale. L'approccio più comune per utilizzare queste rappresentazioni prevede la messa a punto per un compito finale. Tuttavia, come la messa a punto cambi lo spazio di incorporazione sottostante è meno studiato. In questo lavoro, studiamo la famiglia inglese BERT e utilizziamo due tecniche di sondaggio per analizzare come la messa a punto cambia lo spazio. Ipotizziamo che la messa a punto influisca sulle prestazioni di classificazione aumentando le distanze tra esempi associati a etichette diverse. Confermiamo questa ipotesi con esperimenti attentamente progettati su cinque diversi compiti NLP. Attraverso questi esperimenti, scopriamo anche un'eccezione alla saggezza prevalente che ``la messa a punto migliora sempre le prestazioni''. Infine, confrontando le rappresentazioni prima e dopo la messa a punto, scopriamo che la messa a punto non introduce modifiche arbitrarie alle rappresentazioni; Invece, regola le rappresentazioni alle attività a valle preservando in gran parte la struttura spaziale originale dei punti dati.", 'kk': 'Қазіргі NLP-де алдын- ала оқылған контекстуалды көрсетілімдердің көпшілігі болса, олардың мәліметін түсіну және неге әрқашанда сәтті болғанын түсіну үшін көптеген жұмыс істеді. Бұл кескіндерді қолдану үшін ең көпшілік тәсілі оларды соңғы тапсырма үшін баптауға болады. Бірақ, негізгі ендіру бос орынды қанша дұрыс түзету өзгертілмейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз ағылшын BERT үйлерін зерттеп, екі проб техникасын қолданып, кеңістігін қанша дұрыс баптауға ауыстыру үшін анализ етік. Біз жарлық жарлықтар арасындағы қашықтық қашықтығын өзгертуге болады. Біз бұл гипотезаны бес түрлі NLP тапсырмалардың тәжірибелерімен тәжірибелерімен тәжірибеледі. Бұл тәжірибелер арқылы, біз сондай-ақ "тәжірибелеу әрқашан жұмыс істеуді жақсартып тұрады" деген үлкен ғылымды табыламыз. Соңында, таңбаларды алдында және соңында салыстырып, таңбалау үшін таңбалау керек өзгерістерді таңбаламайды. Ол деректер нүктелерінің негізгі бос орын құрылғысын сақтау үшін тапсырмаларды төмендету тапсырмаларына баптайды.', 'ka': 'დღეს NLP-ში წარმოადგენული კონტექსტუალური გამოსახულებების წარმოდგენება, რატომ ისინი უფრო წარმოდგენიან ინფორმაციის შესახებ და რატომ ისინი ყველაფერი წარმოდგენია. ყველაზე საერთო პროგრამის გამოყენება ამ გამოსახულებების გამოყენებაში შესაძლებელია დასრულებული დავალება. თუმცა, რამდენი კონფიგურაცია ცვლილება ქვემოთ დაკავშირებული სივრცე უფრო კონფიგურაცია. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ინგლისური ბერტის ოჯახის შესწავლით და გამოყენებთ ორი პრობენტის ტექნოგიები, რომ ანალიზაცით თუ როგორ სწორი კონფიგურაცია ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ კლასიფიკაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციას გააკეთებს, განსხვავებული მაგალითან დაკავშირებული მაგალითან განსხვავებული განსხვავებების გადა ჩვენ ამის ჰიპოტეზას დარწმუნეთ ხუთი განსხვავებული NLP დავალების განსაზღვრული ექსპერიმენტებით. ამ ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენებით ჩვენ ასევე აღმოჩნეთ განაკუთრების გამოსახულება, რომელიც უფრო ძალიან მეცნიერებელი იყოს, რომელიც `სწორედ კონფი საბოლოოდ, გამოყენებული გამოსახულებების წინ და შემდეგ, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სწორედ კონფიგურაცია არ შევცვალობს გამოსახულებების შეცვლების შემდეგ; მაშინ, ის აკეთებს გამოსახულებების შესახებ მონაცემების დასახულებლად, მაშინ უფრო დიდი ფართლიური სტრუქტურაცია მონაცემების დასახულებლად.', 'ms': "Mengingat kebanyakan perwakilan kontekstualisasi yang dilatih di NLP hari ini, terdapat banyak usaha untuk memahami maklumat apa yang mereka mengandungi, dan mengapa mereka kelihatan berjaya secara umum. Pendekatan paling umum untuk menggunakan perwakilan ini melibatkan penyesuaian mereka untuk tugas akhir. Namun, bagaimana penyesuaian mengubah ruang penyambungan yang didasarkan kurang dipelajari. Dalam kerja ini, kami mempelajari keluarga BERT Inggeris dan menggunakan dua teknik penyelidikan untuk menganalisis bagaimana penyesuaian mengubah ruang. We hypothesize that fine-tuning affects classification performance by increasing the distances between examples associated with different labels.  Kami mengesahkan hipotesis ini dengan eksperimen yang direka dengan hati-hati pada lima tugas NLP yang berbeza. Melalui eksperimen ini, kami juga menemui pengecualian kepada kebijaksanaan yang berkuasa yang ``penyesuaian sentiasa meningkatkan prestasi''. Akhirnya, dengan membandingkan perwakilan sebelum dan selepas penyesuaian, kami menemukan bahawa penyesuaian tidak memperkenalkan perubahan arbitrari kepada perwakilan; selain itu, ia menyesuaikan perwakilan kepada tugas turun sementara kebanyakan menyimpan struktur ruang asal titik data.", 'ml': "Given the prevalence of pre-trained contextualized representations in today's NLP, there have been many efforts to understand what information they contain, and why they seem to be universally successful.  ഈ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും സാധാരണമായ വഴിയില്\u200d അവസാനിക്കുന്ന ജോലിക്കായി അവയെ നല്ല തു എന്നിട്ടും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള അകത്തുള്ള സ്ഥലം എത്ര നന്നായി മാറ്റുന്നു ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി കുടുംബത്തെ പഠിക്കുകയും, രണ്ട് പരിശോധന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും ചെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന ഉപമകളുമായി കൂടുതല്\u200d ദൂരം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമുക്ക് വിശ്വാസ അഞ്ചു വ്യത്യസ്ത പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മമായി പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഈ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റിയെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പിക് ഈ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു ഒഴിവാക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. 'നല്ല മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടം എപ്പോഴ അവസാനം, പ്രതിനിധികളെ മുമ്പും മുന്\u200dപും പിന്നീടും തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന് ശേഷം നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, നല്ല മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതി അതിനു പകരം, അത് നദിയിലെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നു. ഡേറ്റാ പോയിന്\u200dറുകളുടെ ആദ്യമായ സ്പാസ്റ്റിയേല്\u200d ഘടന", 'mt': 'Minħabba l-prevalenza ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwalizzati mħarrġa minn qabel fil-NLP tal-lum, kien hemm ħafna sforzi biex jifhmu x’informazzjoni fihom, u għaliex jidhru li għandhom suċċess universali. The most common approach to use these representations involves fine-tuning them for an end task.  Yet, how fine-tuning changes the underlying embedding space is less studied.  F’dan ix-xogħol, nistudjaw il-familja Ingliża BERT u nużaw żewġ tekniki ta’ sondage biex janalizzaw kif l-irfinar ibiddel l-ispazju. Aħna nieħdu l-ipoteżi li l-irfinar jaffettwa l-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni billi jżid id-distanzi bejn eżempji assoċjati ma’ tikketti differenti. Aħna kkonfermaw din l-ipoteżi b’esperimenti mfassla bir-reqqa fuq ħames kompiti differenti tal-NLP. Permezz ta’ dawn l-esperimenti, niskopru wkoll eċċezzjoni għall-għerf prevalenti li “l-aġġustament dejjem itejjeb il-prestazzjoni”. Fl-aħħar nett, billi tqabblu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet qabel u wara l-aġġustament fin, niskopru li l-aġġustament fin ma jintroduċix bidliet arbitrarji fir-rappreżentazzjonijiet; minflok, jaġġusta r-rappreżentazzjonijiet għal kompiti downstream filwaqt li fil-biċċa l-kbira jippreserva l-istruttura ġeografika oriġinali tal-punti tad-dejta.', 'mk': 'Со оглед на појавата на предобучени контекстуални претставувања во денешниот НЛП, постојат многу напори за да се разбере какви информации содржат и зошто се чини дека се универзално успешни. The most common approach to use these representations involves fine-tuning them for an end task.  Сепак, колку финетизирање го менува основниот вставен простор е помалку проучувано. Во оваа работа, го проучуваме англиското семејство БЕРТ и користиме две техники за проверка за анализирање како финетизирањето го менува просторот. Ние хипотезираме дека финотизирањето влијае на резултатите на класификацијата со зголемување на растојанијата помеѓу примерите поврзани со различни етикети. We confirm this hypothesis with carefully designed experiments on five different NLP tasks.  Со овие експерименти, исто така, откриваме исклучок од владејачката мудрост која „финетизирањето секогаш ја подобрува изведбата“. Конечно, споредувајќи ги претставувањата пред и по финетизирање, откриваме дека финетизирањето не воведува арбитрални промени во претставувањата; наместо тоа, ги прилагодува претставувањата на понатамошните задачи, при што во голема мера ја зачувува оригиналната просторна структура на податочните точки.', 'lt': "Given the prevalence of pre-trained contextualized representations in today's NLP, there have been many efforts to understand what information they contain, and why they seem to be universally successful.  Dažniausias metodas, kaip naudotis šiomis nuorodomis, susijęs su jų tikslinimu galutinei užduotimi. Vis dėlto mažiau tiriama, kaip koreguojama pagrindinė įdėjimo erdvė. Šiame darbe mes studijuojame anglų BERT šeimą ir naudojame du bandymų metodus analizuojant, kaip patobulinimas keičia erdvę. Mes hipotezuojame, kad patobulinimas daro poveikį klasifikavimo charakteristikoms didinant atstumus tarp pavyzdžių, susijusių su skirtingomis etiketėmis. Patvirtiname šią hipotezę kruopščiai suprojektuotais eksperimentais penkių skirtingų NLP užduočių atžvilgiu. Via these experiments, we also discover an exception to the prevailing wisdom that ``fine-tuning always improves performance''.  Galiausiai, palygindami atstovavimus prieš ir po tobulinimo, nustatome, kad tobulinimas nesukelia savavališkų atstovavimų pakeitimų; vietoj to ji koreguoja atstovavimus prie tolesnių užduočių ir iš esmės išsaugo pirminę duomenų taškų erdvinę struktūrą.", 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр НЛП-д сургалтын өмнө сургалтын үзүүлэлтийн талаар илэрхийлэгдсэн үзүүлэлтийг ойлгохын тулд тэдний ямар мэдээлэл агуулж байгааг ойлгохын тулд олон хичээл байсан бөгөөд яагаад тэд ертөнцөд амжилттай мэт сан Эдгээр илтгэлүүдийг ашиглах хамгийн ихэвчлэн арга нь төгсгөл даалгавраар сайжруулах юм. Гэхдээ суурилсан орон зай хэр сайхан өөрчлөгдөж байгааг бага судалсан. Энэ ажил дээр бид Англи БЕРТ гэр бүлийг судалж, хоёр судалгааны технологийг хэрхэн сайхан зайг өөрчлөхөд шинжилгээ хийх хэрэгтэй. Бид тохиромжтой тохиромжтой хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг олон жагсаалттай холбоотой жишээн хоорондын зайг нэмэгдүүлэхээр нөлөөлдөг гэж боддог. Бид энэ таван өөр NLP даалгаварын туршилтыг анхааралтай зохион байгуулсан гэдгийг баталж байна. Эдгээр туршилтуудын аргаар бид мөн "сайн тохиолдлууд үргэлж үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг" мэргэжлийн тухай гайхалтай зүйлийг олж мэднэ. Эцэст нь, өмнө болон дараа нь илтгэлийг харьцуулахад бид сайн зохицуулах нь илтгэлийн хувьд зөв өөрчлөлт биш гэдгийг олж мэдсэн. Үүний оронд энэ нь өгөгдлийн цэгүүдийн эхний орон зай бүтээгдэхүүнийг багасгах үйл ажиллагаанд зохицуулдаг.', 'no': 'Given utbredelsen av først trengte kontekstualiserte representasjonar i NLP i dagens dag, har det vært mange forsøk for å forstå kva informasjon dei inneheld, og hvorfor dei ser ut til å vera universelt suksessfulle. Den vanlege tilnærminga å bruka desse representasjonane involverer å finne dei til ein sluttoppgåve. Men kor finnstilling endrar underliggende innbyggingsplass er mindre studiert. I denne arbeiden studerer vi engelsk BERT-familien og bruker to proberingsteknikk for å analysere korleis fine-tuning endrar rommet. Vi hypotiserer at fine-tuning påvirkar klassifikasjonen ved å auka avstandane mellom eksemplar som er tilknytta med ulike merkelappar. Vi stadfestar denne hipotesen med forsiktig design eksperimenter på fem ulike NLP- oppgåver. Med disse eksperimentene oppdager vi også eit unntak til den overvåande vitenskapen som «finn oppretting alltid forbetrar utviklinga». Etter slutt, ved å sammenligne representasjonane før og etter finnstilling, oppdager vi at finnstilling ikkje introduserer tilfeldige endringar til representasjonar. I staden tilpassar det representasjonane til nedstrømte oppgåver mens stort lagrar den opprinnelige mellomromstrukturen av datapunkta.', 'ro': "Având în vedere prevalența reprezentărilor contextualizate pre-instruite în PNL de astăzi, au existat multe eforturi pentru a înțelege ce informații conțin și de ce par să aibă succes universal. Cea mai comună abordare a utilizării acestor reprezentări implică reglarea fină a acestora pentru o sarcină finală. Cu toate acestea, modul în care reglarea fină modifică spațiul de încorporare subiacent este mai puțin studiat. În această lucrare, studiem familia engleză BERT și folosim două tehnici de sondare pentru a analiza modul în care reglarea fină schimbă spațiul. Ipotezăm că reglarea fină afectează performanța clasificării prin creșterea distanțelor dintre exemplele asociate cu diferite etichete. Confirmăm această ipoteză prin experimente atent concepute pe cinci sarcini diferite PNL. Prin aceste experimente, descoperim și o excepție de la înțelepciunea predominantă că ``reglarea fină îmbunătățește întotdeauna performanța''. În cele din urmă, prin compararea reprezentărilor înainte și după reglare fină, descoperim că reglarea fină nu introduce modificări arbitrare în reprezentări; în schimb, ajustează reprezentările la activitățile din aval, păstrând în mare măsură structura spațială inițială a punctelor de date.", 'pl': 'Biorąc pod uwagę powszechność wstępnie przeszkolonych kontekstualizowanych reprezentacji w dzisiejszym NLP, podjęto wiele wysiłków, aby zrozumieć, jakie informacje zawierają i dlaczego wydają się one być powszechnie udane. Najczęstsze podejście do stosowania tych reprezentacji polega na dostosowaniu ich do zadania końcowego. Jednak w mniejszym stopniu badano, jak precyzyjne dostrojenie zmienia podstawową przestrzeń osadzania. W niniejszej pracy badamy angielską rodzinę BERT i wykorzystujemy dwie techniki sondowania do analizy, w jaki sposób drobne dostrojenie zmienia przestrzeń. Zakładamy hipotezę, że dostosowanie wpływa na wydajność klasyfikacji poprzez zwiększenie odległości między przykładami związanymi z różnymi etykietami. Potwierdzamy tę hipotezę starannie zaprojektowanymi eksperymentami na pięciu różnych zadaniach NLP. Dzięki tym eksperymentom odkrywamy również wyjątek od panującej mądrości, że "dostrajanie zawsze poprawia wydajność". Wreszcie, porównując reprezentacje przed i po dostrajaniu, odkrywamy, że dostrajanie nie wprowadza arbitralnych zmian w reprezentacjach; Zamiast tego dostosowuje reprezentacje do dalszych zadań, zachowując w dużej mierze oryginalną strukturę przestrzenną punktów danych.', 'sr': 'S obzirom na prevalenciju predobučenih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja u današnjem NLP-u, postojalo je mnogo napora da shvate šta sadrže informacije i zašto izgleda da su univerzalno uspješni. Najčešći pristup korištenju ovih predstavljanja uključuje da ih finalizuju za krajnji zadatak. Ipak, koliko je dobra prilagodba promijenila temeljni integracijski prostor manje proučavan. U ovom poslu, proučavamo englesku porodicu BERT i koristimo dve tehnike probanja kako bi analizirali kako dobro navedenje menja prostor. Pretpostavljamo da fino podešavanje utiče na klasifikaciju povećanjem udaljenosti između primjera povezanih sa različitim etiketama. Potvrđujemo ovu hipotezu sa pažljivo dizajniranim eksperimentima na pet različitih NLP zadataka. Prema ovim eksperimentima, takođe otkrivamo izuzetak prevladavajuće mudrosti koje „finalna sredstva uvek poboljšava izvedbu“. Konačno, uspoređujući predstave prije i nakon isprave, otkrili smo da napravljenje ne predstavlja proizvodnje promjene predstavljanja; Umesto toga, ona prilagođuje predstave na spuštanje zadataka dok u velikoj meri čuva originalnu prostornu strukturu podataka.', 'ta': "இன்று NLP-ல் முன் பயிற்சி முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட பிரதிநிதிகளுக்கு முன்னேற்றம் கொடுத்தால், அவர்களில் உள்ள தகவல் என்ன என்பதை புரிந்து கொள்ள பல மு இந்த குறிப்பிடுகளை பயன்படுத்த பொதுவான வழியில் முடிவு செய்ய அவர்களை நன்றாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும். ஆனால், அடிப்படையில் உள்ள இடைவெளியை எவ்வளவு நன்றாக மாற்றுகிறது என்பது குறைந்தது படிக்கப்பட்டது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஆங்கிலத்தில் BERT குடும்பத்தைப் படித்து இரண்டு சோதிக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தைப் பயன்படுத்தி வெ நாம் நினைவூட்டுகிறோம். நன்றாக குறிப்புகள் வகைப்படுத்தல் செயல்பாட்டை அதிகரித்து வேறு சிட்டைகளுடன் இணைக்கப்பட் நாம் ஐந்து வித்தியாசமான NLP பணிகளில் கவனமாக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட சோதனைகளை உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறோம். இந்த சோதனைகள் மூலம், நாம் ஒரு வித்தியாசம் கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் 'நன்றாக முன்னேற்றத்தை எப்போதும் முடிக்கிறது' என்ற இறுதியாக, முன் மற்றும் நன்றாக குறிப்பிடுவதற்கு பின்னும் ஒப்பிடுதல் மூலம் நாம் அறிந்து கொள்கிறோம் சரியான குறிப்பி அதற்கு பதிலாக, அது கீழ் நீர் பணிகளுக்கு பிரதிநிதிகளை மாற்றுகிறது, பெரும்பாலாக தகவல் புள்ளிகளின் மூல வெளியீட்டு உரு", 'sv': 'Med tanke på förekomsten av pre-utbildade kontextualiserade representationer i dagens NLP, har det gjorts många ansträngningar för att förstå vilken information de innehåller, och varför de verkar vara allmänt framgångsrika. Det vanligaste sättet att använda dessa representationer är att finjustera dem för en slutuppgift. Men hur finjustering förändrar det underliggande inbäddningsutrymmet studeras mindre. I detta arbete studerar vi den engelska BERT-familjen och använder oss av två sondtekniker för att analysera hur finjustering förändrar utrymmet. Vi hypoteser att finjustering påverkar klassificeringens prestanda genom att öka avståndet mellan exempel förknippade med olika etiketter. Vi bekräftar denna hypotes med noggrant utformade experiment på fem olika NLP-uppgifter. Genom dessa experiment upptäcker vi också ett undantag från den rådande visdomen att "finjustering alltid förbättrar prestanda". Slutligen, genom att jämföra representationerna före och efter finjustering, upptäcker vi att finjustering inte medför godtyckliga ändringar av representationer. I stället anpassar den representationerna till nedströmsuppgifter samtidigt som datapunkternas ursprungliga rumsliga struktur bevaras.', 'ur': 'آج کے NLP میں پہلے تدریس کی تصویر کی گھمنڈی کی وجہ سے بہت سی کوشش ہوئی ہیں کہ سمجھ سکیں ان کے پاس کیا معلومات ہے اور کیوں انہوں نے سارے کامیاب بنی ہیں۔ یہ نمونات کے استعمال کرنے کے زیادہ مشترک طریقہ میں ان کو آخری کام کے لئے ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک کرنا ہے۔ لیکن، کم پڑھا جاتا ہے کہ اسے کس طرح پاکیزہ تغییر دینے کی جگہ بدل دیتا ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم انگلیسی BERT کے گھر والوں کو پڑھتے ہیں اور دو پروپینٹ ٹیکنیک استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کس طرح سیدھی تنظیم کی جگہ بدلتی ہے۔ ہم فرض کرتے ہیں کہ پاکیزگی تنظیم کے ذریعہ مختلف لابلوں کے درمیان دور افزایش کرتی ہے۔ ہم اس فرضی کو مطمئن کرتے ہیں کہ پانچ مختلف NLP کے کاموں پر مضطرح طراحی کی آزمائش کے ساتھ۔ یہ آزمائش کے ذریعہ، ہم نے بھی غالب حکمت کے علاوہ ایک اگلوں کو پہچان لیا ہے جسے "اچھی تنظیم ہمیشہ اچھی طرح کرتا ہے" آخر میں، نمونات سے پہلے اور بعد کی مثالیں مثالیں کرتے ہیں، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ پاکیزہ تغییرات نمونات کے ساتھ کسی طرح کی تغییر نہیں پہنچاتا، اس کے بدلے، یہ دھونسٹریم ٹاکس کے معاملات کو اضافہ کر رہا ہے، حالانکہ بہت سے دکھائی پوینٹوں کی اصلی فضائی ساختار کی حفاظت کرتی ہے.', 'si': "අද NLP වල ඉදිරියට ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, ඔවුන් තොරතුරු තේරුම් ගන්න ගොඩක් උත්සාහ කරලා තියෙන් මේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය භාවිතා කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් අවසාන වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ඔවුන්ව හොඳ සැකසු නමුත්, කොච්චර හොඳ සංවිධානය වෙනස් කරලා තියෙන්නේ පහළ සංවිධානය අධ්\u200dයානය වෙන්නේ  මේ වැඩේ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි බෙර්ට් පවුලේ අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාපය දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා කො අපි හිතාගන්නවා වෙනස් ලේබල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ උදාහරණ වලින් විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරභාවිත කරනවා කියලා. අපි මේ විශ්වාස සහතික කරනවා වෙනස් NLP වැඩක් පහත් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න. මේ පරීක්ෂණ වලින්, අපි හොයාගන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන ජීවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම 'හොඳ සංකේතනය' හැම අන්තිමේදී, ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කලින් සහ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා වගේම, අපි හොයාගන්නවා හොයාගන්නේ හොයාගන්නේ න ඒ වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක දත්ත පින්තුවන්ගේ මූලික ස්ථානය සංස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිරූපයක් පහත් වෙනුවෙන් සැක", 'so': 'Sida uu horumarinta horay u tababaray representations ka mid ah NLP-kii maantadan, waxaa jiray dadaal badan in la garto macluumaadka ay ku jiraan iyo sababta ay u muuqato inay ku liibaansanyahay caalamka. Dhaqaalaha ugu wada caadiga ah ee isticmaalka noocyadaas waxaa ka mid ah hagitaanka shaqada dhamaadka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, siday u beddelaan cirka hoose ee daboolka ah ayaa wax ka yar la baran karaa. Shuqulkaas waxaynu baranaynaa qoyska Ingiriiska BERT, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa laba qalabka imtixaanka si aan u baarayno siduu u beddelayo cirka saxda. Waxaynu u malaynaynaa in sameynta si fiican ay u saameyso tababarka fasaxda, waxayna ku kordhisaa meel u dhaxaysa tusaale ahaan la xiriira alaabta kala duduwan. We confirm this hypothesis with carefully designed experiments on five different NLP tasks.  Imtixaankan daraaddood, waxaynu ognahay xigmadda caadiga ah oo ay `si wanaagsan mar walba horumariyo tababarka’. Ugu dambaysta, markaynu isbarbardhigno muuqashada horay iyo ka dib, waxaynu ogaannaa in xiriirka wanaagsanu uusan beddeleyn beddelka qofka la doortay; badalkeeda, waxay u hagaajisaa shaqooyinka hoose ee webiga, inta badan waxay ilaalinaysaa dhismaha asalka ah ee goobaha macluumaadka.', 'uz': 'Given the prevalence of pre-trained contextualized representations in today\'s NLP, there have been many efforts to understand what information they contain, and why they seem to be universally successful.  Bu tashkilotlardan foydalanish uchun eng umumiy usul ularni endi vazifa uchun yaxshi ko\'rsatadi. Lekin, juda yaxshi suhbat darajasi qanday o\'zgarishni o\'rganish mumkin. Bu ishda biz ingliz tili BERT oilasini o\'rganamiz va ikkita tizimni o\'rganamiz va qanchalik o\'zgarishni o\'rganish uchun ikkita suhbatlardan foydalanamiz. Biz yaxshi suhbat tugmasi boshqa tugmalar bilan bog\'liq masallarning orasidagi darajalashtirish natijasini oshadi. Biz bu hypotheyasini 5 boshqa NLP vazifalari bilan taʼminlov qilingan tashkilotlarni ishlatimiz. Bu tajribalar bilan biz "davom etish davomida hamisha bajarish imkoniyatini o\'zgartiradi" deb tushunamiz. Endi, avval va yaxshi suhbatdan keyin tashkilotlar bilan o\'rganish mumkin, yaxshi suhbat tashkilotlarni tashkilotga o\'zgarishni anglatmaydi; Ularni o\'zgartiradi, bu ko\'proq maʼlumot nuqtlarining asl spatial structuriyasini saqlaydi.', 'vi': 'Dựa vào phổ biến các biểu hiện tình hình được huấn luyện trước trong lập trình ngôn ngữ New York hôm nay, đã có rất nhiều nỗ lực để hiểu được những thông tin họ chứa, và tại sao họ dường như thành công trên khắp thế giới. Cách thức phổ biến nhất để sử dụng những biểu tượng này là phải sửa chữa chúng cho một nhiệm vụ cuối cùng. Tuy nhiên, cách độ chính xác thay đổi không gian ghép nền sẽ ít được nghiên cứu hơn. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu gia đình BERT tiếng Anh và sử dụng hai kỹ thuật thăm dò để phân tích cách độ cẩn thận thay đổi không gian. Chúng tôi giả thiết rằng độ cẩn thận ảnh hưởng đến hiệu ứng phân hạng bằng cách tăng khoảng cách giữa ví dụ gắn với các nhãn khác nhau. Chúng tôi xác nhận giả thuyết này với thí nghiệm được thiết kế cẩn thận với năm công việc. Qua các thí nghiệm này, chúng tôi cũng khám phá ra một ngoại lệ với trí tuệ phổ biến mà "độ chín-độ luôn cải thiện lợi nhuận". Cuối cùng, bằng cách so sánh các biểu tượng trước và sau khi chỉnh sửa, chúng tôi nhận ra rằng độ cẩn thận không thay đổi gì tùy ý; Thay vào đó, thay vào đó, điều chỉnh các biểu đồ theo các công việc xuôi dòng trong khi phần lớn bảo vệ cấu trúc địa phương gốc của các điểm dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Предвид разпространението на предварително обучените контекстуализирани представи в днешната НЛП, са положени много усилия да се разбере каква информация съдържат те и защо изглеждат универсално успешни. Най-често срещаният подход за използване на тези представяния включва фината им настройка за крайна задача. Въпреки това, как фината настройка променя основното пространство за вграждане е по-малко проучена. В тази работа изучаваме английското семейство и използваме две сондиращи техники, за да анализираме как фината настройка променя пространството. Ние предполагаме, че фината настройка влияе върху класификационната ефективност чрез увеличаване на разстоянията между примерите, свързани с различни етикети. Потвърждаваме тази хипотеза с внимателно проектирани експерименти върху пет различни задачи на НЛП. Чрез тези експерименти откриваме и изключение от преобладаващата мъдрост, че "фината настройка винаги подобрява производителността". И накрая, сравнявайки представителствата преди и след фината настройка, откриваме, че фината настройка не въвежда произволни промени в представителствата; вместо това тя коригира представянето към задачите надолу по веригата, като същевременно до голяма степен запазва първоначалната пространствена структура на точките от данни.', 'nl': "Gezien de prevalentie van vooraf getrainde contextualiseerde representaties in het huidige NLP, zijn er veel inspanningen gedaan om te begrijpen welke informatie ze bevatten en waarom ze universeel succesvol lijken te zijn. De meest voorkomende benadering om deze representaties te gebruiken is het fine-tunen ervan voor een eindtaak. Hoe finetuning de onderliggende inbeddingsruimte verandert, wordt echter minder bestudeerd. In dit werk bestuderen we de Engelse BERT-familie en gebruiken we twee meettechnieken om te analyseren hoe finetuning de ruimte verandert. We veronderstellen dat fine-tuning invloed heeft op classificatieprestaties door de afstanden tussen voorbeelden die geassocieerd zijn met verschillende labels te vergroten. We bevestigen deze hypothese met zorgvuldig ontworpen experimenten op vijf verschillende NLP-taken. Via deze experimenten ontdekken we ook een uitzondering op de heersende wijsheid dat ``finetuning altijd prestaties verbetert''. Tot slot, door de representaties voor en na finetuning te vergelijken, ontdekken we dat finetuning geen willekeurige veranderingen in representaties introduceert; In plaats daarvan past het de representaties aan downstreamtaken aan, terwijl de oorspronkelijke ruimtelijke structuur van de gegevenspunten grotendeels behouden blijft.", 'da': "I betragtning af forekomsten af præ-trænede kontekstualiserede repræsentationer i nutidens NLP, har der været mange forsøg på at forstå, hvilke oplysninger de indeholder, og hvorfor de synes at være universelt vellykkede. Den mest almindelige tilgang til at bruge disse repræsentationer indebærer finjustering af dem til en slutopgave. Men hvordan finjustering ændrer det underliggende indlejringsrum er mindre undersøgt. I dette arbejde studerer vi den engelske BERT-familie og bruger to sondeteknikker til at analysere, hvordan finjustering ændrer rummet. Vi antager, at finjustering påvirker klassificeringens ydeevne ved at øge afstanden mellem eksempler forbundet med forskellige etiketter. Vi bekræfter denne hypotese med omhyggeligt designede eksperimenter på fem forskellige NLP-opgaver. Gennem disse eksperimenter opdager vi også en undtagelse fra den fremherskende visdom, at ``finjustering altid forbedrer ydeevnen''. Endelig opdager vi ved at sammenligne repræsentationerne før og efter finjustering, at finjustering ikke medfører vilkårlige ændringer i repræsentationerne; I stedet justerer den repræsentationerne til downstream-opgaver, samtidig med at datapunkternes oprindelige geografiske struktur i vid udstrækning bevares.", 'de': 'Angesichts der Prävalenz vortrainierter kontextualisierter Repräsentationen im heutigen NLP gab es viele Anstrengungen zu verstehen, welche Informationen sie enthalten und warum sie universell erfolgreich zu sein scheinen. Der häufigste Ansatz, diese Darstellungen zu verwenden, besteht darin, sie für eine Endaufgabe zu verfeinern. Wie die Feinabstimmung den zugrunde liegenden Einbettungsraum verändert, ist jedoch weniger erforscht. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir die englische BERT-Familie und verwenden zwei Sondierungstechniken, um zu analysieren, wie Feinabstimmung den Raum verändert. Wir gehen davon aus, dass die Feinabstimmung die Klassifizierungsleistung beeinflusst, indem sie die Abstände zwischen Beispielen erhöht, die mit verschiedenen Labels verknüpft sind. Wir bestätigen diese Hypothese mit sorgfältig konzipierten Experimenten an fünf verschiedenen NLP-Aufgaben. Durch diese Experimente entdecken wir auch eine Ausnahme von der vorherrschenden Weisheit, dass "Feintuning immer die Leistung verbessert". Wenn wir schließlich die Darstellungen vor und nach der Feinabstimmung vergleichen, stellen wir fest, dass die Feinabstimmung keine willkürlichen Änderungen an Darstellungen bewirkt; Stattdessen passt es die Darstellungen an nachgelagerte Aufgaben an, wobei die ursprüngliche räumliche Struktur der Datenpunkte weitgehend beibehalten wird.', 'hr': 'S obzirom na prevalenciju predobučenih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja u današnjem NLP-u, postojalo je mnogo napora da shvati što sadrže informacije i zašto izgleda da su univerzalno uspješni. Najčešći pristup korištenju tih predstavljanja uključuje da ih finaliziraju na krajnji zadatak. Ipak, koliko je dobra prilagodba promijenila temeljni ugrađeni prostor manje proučavan. U ovom poslu, proučavamo englesku obitelj BERT-a i koristimo dvije tehnike probanja kako bi analizirali kako dobro navedenje mijenja prostor. Pretpostavljamo da dobro održavanje utječe na učinkovitost klasifikacije povećanjem udaljenosti između primjera povezanih s različitim etiketama. Potvrđujemo ovu hipotezu sa pažljivo dizajniranim eksperimentima na pet različitih NLP zadataka. Prema ovim eksperimentima, također otkrivamo izuzetak prevladavajuće mudrosti koje „isprava uvek poboljšava izvođenje“. Konačno, uspoređujući predstavke prije i nakon isprave, otkrili smo da naprava ne predstavlja proizvodne promjene predstavljanja; Umjesto toga, ona prilagođuje predstave na spuštanje zadataka dok u velikoj mjeri čuva originalnu prostornu strukturu podataka.', 'id': "Given the prevalence of pre-trained contextualized representations in today's NLP, there have been many efforts to understand what information they contain, and why they seem to be universally successful.  Pendekatan paling umum untuk menggunakan representation ini melibatkan memperbaikinya untuk tugas akhir. Namun, bagaimana penyesuaian perubahan ruang penerbangan dasar kurang dipelajari. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempelajari keluarga BERT Inggris dan menggunakan dua teknik penyelidikan untuk menganalisis bagaimana penyesuaian mengubah ruang. Kami hipotesis bahwa penyesuaian yang mempengaruhi prestasi klasifikasi dengan meningkatkan jarak antara contoh yang berhubungan dengan label yang berbeda. Kami mengkonfirmasi hipotesis ini dengan eksperimen merancang dengan hati-hati pada lima tugas NLP yang berbeda. Melalui eksperimen ini, kami juga menemukan pengecualian dari kebijaksanaan yang berkuasa bahwa ``penyesuaian selalu meningkatkan prestasi''. Akhirnya, dengan membandingkan perwakilan sebelum dan setelah penyesuaian, kami menemukan bahwa penyesuaian tidak memperkenalkan perubahan secara arbitrar pada perwakilan; sebaliknya, ia menyesuaikan representation ke tugas turun sementara kebanyakan memelihara struktur ruang asli dari titik data.", 'sw': 'Kutokana na uwezekano wa wawakilishi walio na mafunzo ya awali katika chama cha NLP leo, kumekuwa na jitihada nyingi za kuelewa kina taarifa, na kwa nini wanaonekana kuwa wamefanikiwa duniani kote. Hatua ya kawaida zaidi ya kutumia uwakilishi hawa inahusisha kuwatunza vizuri kwa kazi ya mwisho. Hata hivyo, ni kwa kiasi gani mabadiliko yanayobadilika nafasi ya kuingia katika maeneo ya kawaida hayajafunzwa. Katika kazi hii, tunasoma familia ya Kiingereza ya BERT na tunatumia mbinu mbili za kuchunguza namna ya kubadilisha nafasi hii. Tunafiki kwamba mafunzo mazuri yanaathiri utendaji wa usambazaji kwa kuongeza umbali kati ya mifano yanayohusiana na mabango tofauti. We confirm this hypothesis with carefully designed experiments on five different NLP tasks.  Kutokana na majaribio haya, pia tunagundua tofauti kwa ujuzi unaoendelea kuwa “mafunzo mazuri mara zote yanaboresha utendaji”. Mwisho, kwa kuwalinganisha maoni yaliyopita na baada ya kubadilisha vizuri, tunagundua kwamba ujumbe mzuri hauleti mabadiliko ya kiholela ya uwakilishi; badala yake, inabadilisha uwakilishi kwenye kazi za mito chini wakati kwa kiasi kikubwa kulinda muundo wa asili wa anga wa vituo vya taarifa.', 'ko': "오늘날의 NLP에서 사전 훈련의 상황화 표현이 매우 보편적이라는 것을 감안하여 사람들은 그들이 어떤 정보를 포함하고 있는지, 왜 그들이 보편적으로 성공한 것 같은지 이해하기 위해 많은 노력을 기울였다.이러한 표시를 사용하는 가장 흔히 볼 수 있는 방법은 최종 임무를 위해 그것들을 미세하게 조정하는 것이다.그러나 밑바닥 삽입 공간을 어떻게 바꾸는지에 대한 연구는 비교적 적다.이 작업에서 우리는 영국 버트 가문을 연구했고 두 가지 탐지 기술을 사용하여 미조가 어떻게 공간을 바꾸는지 분석했다.우리는 서로 다른 라벨과 관련된 예시 사이의 거리를 늘려서 분류 성능에 영향을 미친다고 가정한다.우리는 다섯 가지 서로 다른 NLP 임무에 대해 심혈을 기울여 설계한 실험을 통해 이 가설을 증명했다.이러한 실험을 통해 우리는 또 하나의 예외를 발견했다. 즉, '마이크로스피커는 항상 성능을 향상시킨다.'마지막으로 미조 전후의 표시를 비교함으로써 우리는 미조가 표시에 대해 임의로 변경하지 않는다는 것을 발견했다.반대로 하류 임무에 따라 표시를 조정하고 데이터 포인트의 원시 공간 구조를 어느 정도 보존한다.", 'sq': "Duke pasur parasysh përhapjen e përfaqësimeve kontekstuale të paratrajnuara në NLP të sotme, ka patur shumë përpjekje për të kuptuar se çfarë informacioni përmbajnë dhe pse duken të jenë të suksesshme universalisht. The most common approach to use these representations involves fine-tuning them for an end task.  Megjithatë, se si rregullimi ndryshon hapësirën themelore të përfshirjes është më pak studiuar. Në këtë punë, ne studiojmë familjen angleze BERT dhe përdorim dy teknika sondazhi për të analizuar se si rregullimi ndryshon hapësirën. Ne hipotezim se rregullimi i mirë ndikon në performancën e klasifikimit duke rritur distancat midis shembujve të lidhura me etiketa të ndryshme. Ne konfirmojmë këtë hipotezë me eksperimente të projektuara me kujdes në pesë detyra të ndryshme NLP. Nëpërmjet këtyre eksperimenteve, zbulojmë gjithashtu një përjashtim ndaj diturisë së mbizotërueshme që ``rregullimi gjithmonë përmirëson performancën''. Më në fund, duke krahasuar përfaqësimet përpara dhe pas rregullimit të mirë, zbulojmë se rregullimi i mirë nuk fut ndryshime arbitrare në përfaqësimet; në vend të kësaj, ajo rregullon përfaqësimet me detyrat poshtë duke ruajtur kryesisht strukturën hapësire origjinale të pikave të të dhënave.", 'tr': 'Bu gün NLP\'de öňünden öňünden öňünden gelen täsirleriň tapawutlaryna görä, olaryň näme maglumatynyň bardygyny düşünmek üçin köp çabalar bar we näme üçin uniwersipal üstünlik bolup görünýärler. Bu temsilleri kullanmak için en yaygın yaklaşmak, son görevi için onları düzeltmelidir. Indi, iň üçin ýerleşmek üçin giriş seleňi çalyşýar. Bu işde biz Iňlisçe BERT maşgalasyny öwrenýär we iki sanat tekniklerini nähili gowy taýýarlamak üçin ulanýarys. Biz tahmin ediyoruz ki, düzeltmek şeklinde klasifikasyon eserlerini farklı etiketlerle ilgili meselelerin arasındaki uzakları artırarak etkilendirir. Biz bu hypotezii beş farklı NLP işinde örän dikkatly tasarlanmış deneylerle tassyklanýarlar. Bu deneyler bilen hem "gowy düzeltmek" ukyplarynyň üstünliklerini gowylaşdyrýandygyny tapdyk. Soňunda, önündeki ve sonrak ifadeleri karşılaştırarak, düzgün işlemler şeklinde hiç hili bir şekilde ifade etmedik. Bu ýerde, bu representasiýalary aşağı görkezilýän zadlara gollaýar we datu noktalaryň başlangıç ýerinde durum taýýarlaýar.', 'af': "Gien die oorspronklikheid van voor-opgelei contextualiseerde voorstellings in vandag se NLP, het daar baie versoek gewees om te verstaan wat inligting hulle bevat, en hoekom lyk hulle universele suksesvol te wees. Die mees gemeenskaplike toegang om hierdie voorstellings te gebruik, involves fine-tuning hulle vir 'n einde taak. Nogtans, hoe fyn- tuning verander die onderstelling inbettingspasie minder onderwerp word. In hierdie werk studeer ons die Engelse BERT familie en gebruik twee probeerteknike om te analyseer hoe fyn-tuning die spasie verander. Ons hipotesis dat fine-tuning beïnvloor klasifikasie-prestasie deur die afstand tussen voorbeelde wat met verskillende etikette geassosieer word te vermeerder. Ons bevestig hierdie hipotesis met versigtig ontwerp eksperimente op vyf verskillende NLP opdragte. Deur hierdie eksperimente ontdek ons ook 'n uitsondering aan die oorweldige wysheid wat `fine-tuning altyd die prestasie verbeter'. Eindelik, deur te vergelyk die voorstellings voor en ná fyn-tuning, ontdek ons dat fyn-tuning nie willekeurige veranderinge aan voorstellings voorsien nie; In plaas, dit verstel die voorstellings na onderstreem opdragte terwyl groot die oorspronklike spasielle struktuur van die data punte bewaar.", 'am': 'በዛሬ NLP ውስጥ ቀድሞ ተደጋፊ ተሟጋቾች በተደረገ ጊዜ፣ የመረጃ መረጃዎች ምን እንደሆኑ ለማስተዋል ብዙ ጥያቄዎች አሉ፣ ስለምን አቀማሚ ስልጣናት ይታሰናሉ፡፡ እነዚህን መልዕክቶች ለመጠቀም በጣም የተለየ ልማድ ለፍጻሜ ስራ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ Yet, how fine-tuning changes the underlying embedding space is less studied.  በዚህ ሥራ እንግሊዘኛ የBERT ቤተሰቦችን እናስተምርማለን እና ሁለትን የመረጃ ጥያቄዎችን እንዴት እንደሚለውጥ እናስተምር ዘንድ እንጠይቃለን፡፡ ጥሩ ማቀናጃ በተለያዩ ምልክቶች መካከል የሚደረገውን ርቀት በሚያበዛ መጠቀምን እናስባለን፡፡ ይህንን አፍሪካን በአምስት ልዩ የNLP ስራቶች በጥንቃቄ የተፈጠረውን ፈተና እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ በእነዚህ ፈተናዎች ‹‹ደግሞም ዘወትር እውቀትን ለማድረግ› የሚል የጥበብን ነገር አግኝተናል፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ አስቀድሞ እና ከተደጋጋጀች በኋላ መልዕክቶችን በማስተካከል እናውቃለን፡፡ በፋንታ፣ የዳታ ነጥቦች መጀመሪያ የስፋዊ መሠረት በመጠበቅ የውኃው ፈሳሾችን ማድረግ ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'hy': "Եթե հաշվի առնենք նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստալիզացված ներկայացումների տարածությունը այսօրվա ՆԼՊ-ում, շատ ջանքեր են կատարվել հասկանալու համար, թե ինչ ինֆորմացիա են նրանք պարունակում և ինչու են նրանք համաշխարհային հաջողակ թվում: Այս ներկայացումների օգտագործման ամենաընդհանուր մոտեցումը ներառում է վերջնական խնդիրների վերականգնումը: Այնուամենայնիվ, ավելի քիչ ուսումնասիրում են, թե ինչքան փոփոխություններ են տեղադրված ներդրման տարածքը: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք անգլերեն BERT ընտանիքը և օգտագործում ենք երկու ուսումնասիրելու մեթոդներ՝ վերլուծելու համար, թե ինչպես է փոփոխվում տարածքը: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ բարելավումը ազդում է դասակարգման արդյունքին՝ աճելով տարբեր պիտակների հետ կապված օրինակների միջև եղած տարածությունները: We confirm this hypothesis with carefully designed experiments on five different NLP tasks.  Via these experiments, we also discover an exception to the prevailing wisdom that ``fine-tuning always improves performance''.  Վերջապես, համեմատելով ներկայացումները մինչ և հետո, մենք բացահայտում ենք, որ ներկայացումների ներկայացումները կամավոր փոփոխություններ չեն ներկայացնում: փոխարենը, այն հարմարեցնում է ներկայացումները ներքևի գործերին, մինչդեռ հիմնականում պահպանում է տվյալների սկզբնական տարածական կառուցվածքը:", 'bn': 'আজকের এনএলপিতে প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ব প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রাকৃতিত্ব দিয়ে অনেক প্রচেষ্টা বুঝতে পারে যে তথ্য তাদের মধ্যে কি আছে এব এই প্রতিনিধিদের ব্যবহার করার সবচেয়ে সাধারণ উপায় হচ্ছে শেষ কাজের জন্য। Yet, how fine-tuning changes the underlying embedding space is less studied.  এই কাজে আমরা ইংরেজি বিবার্ট পরিবার পড়ি এবং দুটি প্রমাণ প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করি বিশ্লেষণের জন্য যে কিভাবে ভালোভাবে স্থান আমরা হিসেবে বিশ্বাস করি যে ভালো টানিং বিভিন্ন লেবেলের সাথে যোগাযোগের দূরত্ব বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করে। আমরা এই হাইপিথিজকে নিশ্চিত করি যে পাঁচ বিভিন্ন এনএলপি কাজের উপর সতর্ক পরীক্ষা করা পরীক্ষা দিয়েছে। এই পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা বিশেষ জ্ঞানের ব্যতিক্রম আবিষ্কার করি যে ‘ভালোভাবে ভালোভাবে ভালোভাবে প্রদর্শন করা’। শেষ পর্যন্ত, প্রতিনিধিদের তুলনা করার মাধ্যমে আমরা আবিষ্কার করি যে ভালো সংস্কারের প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের কোন বৈধতা  এর পরিবর্তে এটি নীচের কাজের প্রতিনিধিদের সংশোধন করে তথ্য বিন্দুর মূল স্পেসিয়াল কাঠামো সংরক্ষণ করে।', 'az': 'Bu gün NLP-də təhsil edilmiş təhsil göstəricilərin genişliyinə görə, onların nə məlumatlarının barəsində olduğunu anlamaq üçün çox s əbəb oldu və niyə onlar universal başarılı görünür. Bu göstəriciləri istifadə etmək üçün ən yaygın tərzim onları sonun işinə düzəltməkdir. Ancaq, aşağıdaki inşa alanı necə gözəl düzəltdiyini dəyişdirir. Bu işdə, biz İngilizce BERT ailəsini təhsil edir və uzağı necə yaxşı təhsil etmək üçün iki təhsil metodlarını istifadə edirik. Biz təmin edirik ki, müxtəlif etiketlərlə ilişkilər arasındakı məsələlər arasındakı uzaqlarını artıraraq sıralama performansını etkilər. Biz bu hipotezi beş müxtəlif NLP işlərində dikkatli təşkil etdik. Bu təcrübələrin vasitəsilə də "düzəltmə həmişə performansını yaxşılaşdırır" mümkün olan hikmətin istisnasını keçirdik. Sonunda, əvvəl və sonrakı dəlilləri ilə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün gözəl dəyişiklik göstəricisi ilə müvafiq dəyişiklikləri təşkil etməz. Və bunun yerinə, məlumat nöqtələrinin orijinal uzay strukturlarını qoruyarkən göstərilmələri düşürür.', 'bs': 'S obzirom na prevalenciju predobučenih kontekstualiziranih predstavljanja u današnjem NLP-u, postojalo je mnogo napora da shvati šta sadrže informacije i zašto izgleda da su univerzalno uspješni. Najčešći pristup korištenju tih predstavljanja uključuje da ih finaliziraju na krajnji zadatak. Ipak, koliko je dobra prilagodba promijenila temeljni integracijski prostor manje proučavan. U ovom poslu, proučavamo englesku obitelj BERT-a i koristimo dvije tehnike za probu kako bi analizirali kako dobra prilagodba mijenja prostor. Mi pretpostavljamo da fino-tuning utiče na klasifikaciju povećanjem udaljenosti između primjera povezanih sa različitim etiketama. Potvrđujemo ovu hipotezu sa pažljivo dizajniranim eksperimentima na pet različitih NLP zadataka. Prema ovim eksperimentima, također otkrivamo izuzetak prevladavajuće mudrosti koje „isprava uvek poboljšava izvedbu“. Konačno, uspoređujući predstave prije i nakon isprave, otkrili smo da naprava ne predstavlja proizvodne promjene predstavljanja; Umjesto toga, ona prilagođuje predstave na spuštanje zadataka dok u velikoj mjeri čuva originalnu prostornu strukturu podataka.', 'ca': "Tenint en compte la prevalència de representacions contextualitzades pré-entrenades en el NLP d'avui dia, hi ha hagut molts esforços per entendre quina informació contenen i per què semblen tenir èxit universal. L'enfocament més comú per utilitzar aquestes representacions consisteix en ajustar-les per a una tasca final. Però, com canvia l'ajustament de l'espai d'incorporació subjacent és menys estudiat. En aquest treball, estudiem la família anglesa BERT i fem servir dues tècniques de sondage per analitzar com l'ajustament canvia l'espai. Suposem que l'ajustament afecta el rendiment de la classificació augmentant les distàncies entre exemples associats a diferents etiquetes. Confirmem aquesta hipòtesi amb experiments ben dissenyats en cinc tasques diferents de la NLP. A través d'aquests experiments també descobrim una excepció a la saviesa que &lt;i&gt;ajustament&lt;/i&gt;sempre millora el rendiment&lt;/i&gt;. Finalment, comparant les representacions abans i després del millorament, descobrim que el millorament no introdueix canvis arbitraris a les representacions; instead, it adjusts the representations to downstream tasks while largely preserving the original spatial structure of the data points.", 'cs': 'Vzhledem k prevalenci předškolených kontextualizovaných reprezentací v dnešní NLP bylo mnoho snah pochopit, jaké informace obsahují a proč se zdá být univerzálně úspěšné. Nejběžnějším přístupem k použití těchto reprezentací je jemné ladění pro koncový úkol. Nicméně, jak jemné ladění mění základní vkládací prostor, je méně studováno. V této práci studujeme anglickou rodinu BERT a pomocí dvou sondovacích technik analyzujeme, jak jemné ladění mění prostor. Předpokládáme, že jemné ladění ovlivňuje klasifikační výkon zvětšením vzdálenosti mezi příklady spojenými s různými popisky. Tuto hypotézu potvrzujeme pečlivě navrženými experimenty na pěti různých NLP úlohách. Prostřednictvím těchto experimentů také objevujeme výjimku z převažující moudrosti, že "jemné ladění vždy zlepšuje výkon". A konečně porovnáním reprezentací před a po jemném ladění zjistíme, že jemné ladění nezavádí libovolné změny reprezentací; Místo toho přizpůsobuje reprezentace následným úkolům, přičemž do značné míry zachovává původní prostorovou strukturu datových bodů.', 'et': 'Arvestades eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstipõhiste esituste levikut tänapäeva uues õppekavas, on tehtud palju jõupingutusi, et mõista, millist teavet need sisaldavad ja miks need näivad olevat üldiselt edukad. Kõige tavalisem lähenemisviis nende esituste kasutamiseks hõlmab nende täpsustamist lõppülesande jaoks. Kuid vähem uuritakse, kuidas peenhäälestus muudab aluseks olevat manustamisruumi. Selles töös uurime inglise BERT perekonda ja analüüsime, kuidas peenhäälestus ruumi muudab. Hüpoteesime, et peen häälestamine mõjutab klassifitseerimisjõudlust, suurendades erinevate siltidega seotud näidete vahelisi kaugusi. Seda hüpoteesi kinnitame hoolikalt kavandatud katsetega viiel erineval NLP ülesandel. Nende katsete kaudu avastame ka erandi valitsevast tarkusest, et "peenhäälestus parandab alati jõudlust". Lõpuks, võrreldes esitusi enne ja pärast peenhäälestust, avastame, et peenhäälestus ei too kaasa meelevaldseid muudatusi esitustes; selle asemel kohandab see esitusi järgnevate ülesannetega, säilitades samas suures osas andmepunktide algse ruumilise struktuuri.', 'fi': 'Kun otetaan huomioon esikoulutettujen kontekstualisoitujen representaatioiden esiintyvyys nykypäivän NLP:ssä, on pyritty ymmärtämään, mitä tietoja ne sisältävät ja miksi ne näyttävät yleisesti menestyvän. Yleisin tapa käyttää näitä esityksiä on hienosäätää niitä lopputehtävää varten. Kuitenkin sitä, miten hienosäätö muuttaa taustalla olevaa upotustilaa, tutkitaan vähemmän. Tässä työssä tutkimme englanninkielistä BERT-perhettä ja analysoimme kahden luotaustekniikan avulla, miten hienosäätö muuttaa tilaa. Hypoteesimme, että hienosäätö vaikuttaa luokituksen suorituskykyyn lisäämällä eri etiketeihin liittyvien esimerkkien välisiä etäisyyksiä. Vahvistamme tämän hypoteesin huolellisesti suunnitelluilla kokeiluilla viidellä eri NLP-tehtävällä. Näiden kokeilujen kautta löydämme myös poikkeuksen vallitsevaan viisauteen, että "hienosäätö parantaa aina suorituskykyä". Lopuksi vertaamalla esityksiä ennen hienosäätöä ja sen jälkeen huomaamme, että hienosäätö ei aiheuta mielivaltaisia muutoksia esityksiin; Sen sijaan se mukauttaa esitykset loppupään tehtäviin säilyttäen suurelta osin tietopisteiden alkuperäisen paikkarakenteen.', 'fa': 'با وجود فراوانی نمایش\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cشده در NLP امروز، تلاش\u200cهای زیادی برای فهمیدن اطلاعات که دارند و چرا به نظر می\u200cرسند کاملا موفق باشند. نزدیکترین روش برای استفاده از این نمایش\u200cهایinvolves fine tuning them for an end task. با این حال، چقدر تغییر مناسبی جایگاهی پایین درآمد پایین تغییر می\u200cدهد کمتر تحقیق می\u200cشود. در این کار، ما خانواده BERT انگلیسی را مطالعه می کنیم و از دو تکنیک تحقیق استفاده می کنیم تا تحلیل کنیم که چقدر تغییر مناسب فضا را تغییر می دهد. ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که تنظیم\u200cکننده\u200cی پاکیزه\u200cها با افزایش فاصله\u200cهای بین مثال\u200cهای متفاوت با برچسب\u200cهای مختلف اثر می\u200cدهد. ما این فرضیه را با آزمایش های طراحی دقتی روی پنج کار NLP متفاوت تایید می کنیم. از طریق این آزمایشات، ما همچنین یک استثنایی برای دانش فراوانی کشف می کنیم که «آزمایش خوب همیشه عملکرد را بهتر می کند». بالاخره، با مقایسه کردن نمایش\u200cهای قبل و بعد از تنظیم کردن، ما کشف می\u200cکنیم که تنظیم\u200cکننده\u200cها تغییرات تصادفی را به نمایش\u200cدهندگان معرفی نمی\u200cکند. به جای آن، نمایش\u200cهایی را به کارهای پایین\u200cترین پایین تغییر می\u200cدهد، در حالی که عموماً ساختار فضایی اصلی از نقاط داده\u200cها محافظت می\u200cکند.', 'jv': 'Balita kanggo kalah-kalah sing sumulai gambar dengan bantuan sampeyan nguasai NLP iki, akeh bantuan sing gak dhéwé nggawe informasi sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé, soalé dhéwé isih sabên beraksi yang kaké ora seneng gak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nggawe aturan sing paling nggawe representasi iki dadi mbukak njaluk-njaluk kanggo ngilangno nggawe gerakan. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné isih akèh lanjuré BERT Inggris lan gambar sistem sing beraksi iki dadi kanggo ngerasakno supoyo barang nggawe gerakan sampek. Awak dhéwé ngerti ngerasakno ngono cawaran langgambar luwih nggawe Awak dhéwé ngerti apa winih iki ngono kesempatan tentang karo perusahaan lima NLP gak nggawe Nang lan ujaran iki dadi, kita mulasakno kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno sing entuk \'ditambang kanggo ngerasakno njaluk\' Soalé, nggalawih-nggalawih basa gambar lan saben kelas telu-tuning, awak dhéwé nyimpen kuwi dianggawe barang kelas kuwi dianggawe tarjamahan sing ora bisa dianggawe tarjamahan kanggo nambah; saka Taning', 'sk': "Glede na razširjenost predhodno usposobljenih kontekstualiziranih reprezentacij v današnjem NLP je bilo veliko prizadevanj, da bi razumeli, katere informacije vsebujejo in zakaj se zdijo splošno uspešne. Najpogostejši pristop k uporabi teh predstavitev vključuje natančno prilagajanje za končno nalogo. Vendar pa je manj raziskano, kako natančno nastavitev spreminja osnovni vgradni prostor. V tem delu preučujemo angleško družino BERT in z uporabo dveh tehnik sondiranja analiziramo, kako fino nastavitev spreminja prostor. Domnevamo, da natančno nastavitev vpliva na uspešnost klasifikacije s povečanjem razdalj med primeri, povezanimi z različnimi oznakami. To hipotezo potrjujemo s skrbno zasnovanimi eksperimenti na petih različnih nalogah NLP. S temi eksperimenti odkrivamo tudi izjemo od prevladujoče modrosti, da ``fino nastavitev vedno izboljšuje zmogljivost''. Končno, s primerjavo predstavitev pred in po finem uravnavanju ugotavljamo, da fino uravnavanje ne uvaja poljubnih sprememb predstavitev; Namesto tega prilagaja predstavitve nadaljnjim opravilom, pri čemer v veliki meri ohranja prvotno prostorsko strukturo podatkovnih točk.", 'ha': "Given the prevalence of pre-trained contextualized representations in today's NLP, there have been many efforts to understand what information they contain, and why they seem to be universally successful.  Ga mafiya ɗabi'a da za'a yi amfani da waɗannan mataimaka yana da gyãra da su zuwa wani aikin ƙarami. Babu kuma, ko da sauri na canza filin da ke cikin a ƙara ba za'a karatun. Daga wannan aikin, munã karanta family na BERT na Ingiriya kuma munã yi amfani da kowanki biyu na jarraba, dõmin mu yi anayya da jinsi musanya filin da ake musanya. Tuna kai-labari da tun mai kyau na yi amfani da aikin fassarar da ya ƙãra nĩsa a tsakanin misãlai da aka yi danganta da alama dabam-dabam. Tuna gaskata wannan da aka sami jarrabi akan aiki shan dabam na NLP. Daga wannan jarrabai, za'a gane wani abu ba sai da hikima wanda yake iya ƙaranci da `tunkuɗa mai kyau a gaba ɗaya'. Na ƙarama, da sammeni da masu gauraya a gaba ɗaya da bayan mai gyãra, za mu gane cewa tun-gyarani bã ya shiga musanyi ga mutane; Yana juya masu aiki da ke ƙaranci da kuma yana tsare asalin filinaikin da aka danne shi.", 'bo': 'དེ་རིང་NLP་ནང་གི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་འདོད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་གང་ཡོད་པ་ལ་རྟོ སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ཆེ་ཤོས་མཐའ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་མཇུག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་སྟངས་ལ་དོ་དམ་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། རྨས་གཞི་ལྡན་པའི་བར་སྟོང་ཞིག་ལ་ཇི་ལྟར་ཡག་པོ་ཞིག་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཞེང་ཚད་ལྟ་བུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོ We hypothesize that fine-tuning affects classification performance by increasing the distances between example associated with different labels. Examples. We confirm this hypothesis with carefully designed experiments on five different NLP tasks. ང་ཚོས་བརྟན་པར་ཕྱོགས་འདི་དག་ལས་ཀྱང་ཁྱབ་པར་ཨ་ཕིའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་མཐོང་བ་ཞིག་རེད། མཐའ་མར་མ་དང་ཐེངས་རྗེས་མ་ཐང་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པ་མཐུན་ནས། དེ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་བྱ་ཚུལ་ལ་མཇུག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བ་དང་ཆེ་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཆེ་བ་ཡོད་པས།', 'he': 'בהתחשב במדירות של מייצגות קונטוקטואליזציות מאומנות מראש ב NLP היום, היו מאמצים רבים להבין איזה מידע הם מכילים, ולמה הם נראים מוצלחים באופן כללי. הגישה המפורסמת ביותר להשתמש ביציגות אלה מעורבת בהתרגשות שלהם למשימה סופית. עם זאת, איך התרגיל משנה את מרחב ההכניסה הנוכחי פחות נלמד. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו לומדים את משפחת BERT אנגלית ושתמשים בשני טכניקות חקירה כדי לנתח איך התאים משנה את החלל. אנו מניחים שההתאים משפיע על ביצועי ההסגרה על ידי הגבירה של המרחקים בין דוגמאות שקשורות לתוויות שונות. אנחנו מאשרים את ההיפתוזה הזו עם ניסויים מעוצבים בזהירות על חמישה משימות NLP שונות. דרך הניסויים האלה, אנחנו גם מגלים יוצא דופן לחכמות השליטה כי "התאמה תמיד משפר את ההופעה". סוף סוף, על ידי השוואה של הייצגות לפני ואחרי התאים, אנו מגלים שההתאים לא מציג שינויים רציניים לייצגות; instead, it adjusts the representations to downstream tasks while largely preserving the original spatial structure of the data points.'}
{'en': 'Packed Levitated Marker for Entity and Relation Extraction', 'ar': 'التعلم التفاعلي المدرك للجملة لاسترجاع مرور المجال المفتوح', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem contrastiva com reconhecimento de sentença para recuperação de passagem de domínio aberto', 'es': 'Aprendizaje contrastivo con reconocimiento de oraciones para la recuperación de pasajes de dominio abierto', 'fr': 'Apprentissage contrastif sensible à la phrase pour la récupération de passages en domaine ouvert', 'ja': 'オープンドメインパス検索のための文章認識コントラスト学習', 'zh': '开域落检索句感知比学', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन पैसेज रिट्रीवल के लिए वाक्य-जागरूक कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग', 'ru': 'Контрастное обучение, основанное на предложении, для извлечения прохода из открытого домена', 'ga': "Foghlaim Chodarsnachta atá Feasach ar Phianbhreith d'Aisghabháil Sliocht Fearainn Oscailte", 'hu': 'Ítélet-tudatos kontrasztív tanulás a nyílt domain átjárás visszaszerzéséhez', 'ka': 'კონტრესტიგური სწავლება გახსნა დომენის გარეშე', 'kk': 'Орындау домені жүктеу үшін сөздерді білеу контрастық оқыту', 'el': 'Αντιστατική μάθηση για την ανάκτηση διαβατηρίων ανοικτού τομέα', 'it': 'Apprendimento contrastante consapevole delle frasi per il recupero di passaggi a dominio aperto', 'lt': 'Atviro domeno keleivių atgavimo kontrastinis mokymasis, žinomas apie bausmę', 'mk': 'Контрастивно учење на осомничените реченици за преземање на патишта во отворен домен', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн мэдрэмжтэй эсрэг суралцах', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Kontrastif Awas-Hukuman untuk Pemulihan Laluan Domain Buka', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡോമെയിന്\u200d പാസ്സേജ് വീണ്ടും തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുവാനുള്ള വിധി അറിയുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Kontrastiv konxju mis-Sentenzi għall-kisba ta’ Passaġġi f’Dominju Miftuħ', 'ro': 'Învățare contrastivă conștientă de sentință pentru recuperarea pasajelor de domeniu deschis', 'no': 'Kontrast- læring for opna domenepassasjon', 'si': 'වාර්තාවක් දැනගෙන ඉගෙනගන්න', 'pl': 'Uczenie kontrastywne świadome zdania dla odzyskiwania pasażu otwartej domeny', 'so': 'Waxbarashada xiriirka ee la xiriira baasabka furan ee maxkamadda', 'sv': 'Meningsmedvetet kontrastivt lärande för hämtning av öppna domäner', 'sr': 'Kontrastivno učenje otvorenog domena', 'ur': 'اوپن ڈومین پھیر پھیرنے کے لئے مجلس جانے والی کنٹرستی سیکھنا', 'ta': 'திறந்த தளம் கடவுச்சொல் திரும்பப்படுத்தலுக்கான வாக்கு உணர்ந்து தெரியும் தொடர்பு படிப்பு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tự động học tương phản cho khu vực rộng', 'da': 'Sætningsbevidst kontrastiv læring til åbent domæne passage hentning', 'nl': 'Contrastive Learning voor Open-Domain Passage Retrieval op basis van zinnen', 'bg': 'Контрастивно обучение за извличане на пасаж с отворен домейн', 'hr': 'Kontrastivno učenje otvorenog domena', 'de': 'Satzbewusstes kontrastives Lernen für Open-Domain Passage Retrieval', 'ko': '개방역 문장 검색을 위한 문장 감지 대비 학습', 'id': 'Sentence-aware Contrastive Learning for Open-Domain Passage Retrieval', 'fa': 'یادگیری متفاوتی با احترام برای بازیابی مسیر دامنی باز', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Msingi wa Hukumu kwa Kurejesha Usafiri Huru', 'tr': 'Açık alan pasajı geri almak için söz bilinen kontrast öğrenme', 'af': 'Sentence- aware kontrastiewe leer vir Open- Domein Pasmaak Herhaal', 'sq': 'Mësimi kontrastiv i vetëdijshëm për dënimin për marrjen e pasazhit të dominit të hapur', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Առաջին դատողություններից զբաղված հակադրական սովորելը բաց բնագավառի ճամփորդության վերադարձման համար', 'az': 'A칞캼q Domain Ge칞idi almas캼 칲칞칲n S칬z칲 Bil톛n Kontrast 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bn': 'উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন পাস পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য শেষ-সচেতন পরিচিতি শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Kontrastivno učenje otvorenog domena', 'ca': 'Aprendència contrastanta conscient de les sentences per la recuperació de passatges en domini obert', 'cs': 'Kontrastivní učení s větou pro vyhledávání průchodů s otevřenou doménou', 'et': 'Launteadlik kontrastiivne õpe avatud domeeni läbipääsu hankimiseks', 'fi': 'Lausekäyttöinen kontrastinen oppiminen avoimen verkkotunnuksen väylän noutoon', 'jv': 'Sentense-awake contraststive Learning for Open-domain pass retription', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Kontrastivno učenje, ki se zaveda stavkov, za pridobivanje prehoda odprte domene', 'he': 'ללמוד נגד מודע למשפטים לשיגור דרכים במגרש פתוח', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དྲ་ཁོངས་ལ་འཛུགས་སྐྱོང་རྗེས་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྣུམ་ཚོགས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Recent entity and relation extraction works focus on investigating how to obtain a better span representation from the pre trained encoder However a major limitation of existing works is that they ignore the interrelation between spans pairs In this work we propose a novel span representation approach named Packed Levitated Markers PL Marker to consider the interrelation between the spans pairs by strategically packing the markers in the encoder In particular we propose a neighborhood oriented packing strategy which considers the neighbor spans integrally to better model the entity boundary information Furthermore for those more complicated span pair classification tasks we design a subject oriented packing strategy which packs each subject and all its objects to model the interrelation between the same subject span pairs The experimental results show that with the enhanced marker feature our model advances baselines on six NER benchmarks and obtains a 4.1%-4.3 strict relation F1 improvement with higher speed over previous state of the art models on ACE04 and ACE05 Our code and models are publicly available at https://github.com/thunlp/PL-Marker', 'ar': 'تم إثبات فعالية تمثيلات الممرات التدريبية الكثيفة عبر التعلم التباين في استرداد ممر المجال المفتوح (ODPR). تركز الدراسات الحالية على مزيد من التحسين عن طريق تحسين استراتيجية أخذ العينات السلبية أو التدريب المسبق الإضافي. ومع ذلك ، تظل هذه الدراسات مجهولة في التقاط مقطع مع تعارضات التمثيل الداخلي من دقة النمذجة غير الصحيحة. على وجه التحديد ، في ظل ملاحظتنا أن المقطع يمكن تنظيمه بواسطة جمل متعددة مختلفة لغويًا ، فإن نمذجة مثل هذا المقطع كمتجه كثيف موحد ليس هو الأمثل. يقدم هذا العمل بالتالي نموذجًا دقيقًا على أساس التفصيل الأصغر ، الجمل السياقية ، للتخفيف من النزاعات المعنية. بالتفصيل ، نقدم استراتيجية أخذ العينات السلبية أثناء المرور لتشجيع جيل متنوع من تمثيلات الجملة في نفس المقطع. تؤكد التجارب على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات معيارية فعالية طريقتنا ، لا سيما في مجموعات البيانات حيث يكون التعارض شديدًا. تقدم التجارب المكثفة أيضًا قابلية نقل جيدة لطريقتنا عبر مجموعات البيانات.', 'pt': 'O treinamento de representações de passagens densas por meio de aprendizado contrastivo mostrou-se eficaz para recuperação de passagem de domínio aberto (ODPR). Os estudos existentes se concentram em otimizar ainda mais, melhorando a estratégia de amostragem negativa ou pré-treinamento extra. No entanto, esses estudos permanecem desconhecidos na captura de passagens com conflitos internos de representação de granularidade de modelagem imprópria. Especificamente, sob nossa observação de que uma passagem pode ser organizada por várias sentenças semanticamente diferentes, modelar tal passagem como um vetor denso unificado não é ideal. Este trabalho apresenta assim um modelo refinado com base numa menor granularidade, frases contextuais, para atenuar os conflitos em causa. Em detalhes, introduzimos uma estratégia de amostragem negativa na passagem para incentivar uma geração diversificada de representações de sentenças na mesma passagem. Experimentos em três conjuntos de dados de referência verificam a eficácia do nosso método, especialmente em conjuntos de dados onde os conflitos são graves. Extensos experimentos apresentam ainda boa transferibilidade do nosso método entre conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que el entrenamiento de representaciones de pasajes densos a través del aprendizaje contrastivo es eficaz para la recuperación de pasajes de dominio abierto (ODPR). Los estudios existentes se centran en una mayor optimización mediante la mejora de la estrategia de muestreo negativo o la capacitación previa adicional. Sin embargo, estos estudios se mantienen desconocidos en la captura de pasajes con conflictos de representación interna a partir de una granularidad de modelado inadecuada. Específicamente, bajo nuestra observación de que un pasaje puede organizarse mediante múltiples oraciones semánticamente diferentes, modelar un pasaje como un vector denso unificado no es óptimo. Por lo tanto, este trabajo presenta un modelo refinado sobre la base de una granularidad más pequeña, oraciones contextuales, para aliviar los conflictos en cuestión. En detalle, introducimos una estrategia de muestreo negativo dentro del pasaje para fomentar una generación diversa de representaciones de oraciones dentro del mismo pasaje. Los experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos de referencia verifican la eficacia de nuestro método, especialmente en conjuntos de datos donde los conflictos son graves. Los experimentos extensos presentan además una buena transferibilidad de nuestro método a través de conjuntos de datos.', 'fr': "L'entraînement de représentations de passages denses via l'apprentissage contrastif s'est révélé efficace pour la récupération de passages en domaine ouvert (ODPR). Les études existantes se concentrent sur une optimisation plus poussée en améliorant la stratégie d'échantillonnage négatif ou en préformant davantage. Cependant, ces études restent inconnues pour saisir le passage avec des conflits de représentation interne dus à une granularité de modélisation incorrecte. Plus précisément, selon notre observation selon laquelle un passage peut être organisé par plusieurs phrases sémantiquement différentes, la modélisation d'un tel passage en tant que vecteur dense unifié n'est pas optimale. Ce travail présente ainsi un modèle affiné basé sur une granularité plus petite, des phrases contextuelles, pour atténuer les conflits concernés. En détail, nous introduisons une stratégie d'échantillonnage négatif dans le passage afin d'encourager la génération diversifiée de représentations de phrases au sein d'un même passage. Des expériences sur trois ensembles de données de référence vérifient l'efficacité de notre méthode, en particulier sur des ensembles de données où les conflits sont graves. Des expériences approfondies montrent en outre une bonne transférabilité de notre méthode entre les ensembles de données.", 'ja': '対照的な学習を介した訓練密度の高い経路表現は、Open - Domain Passage Retrieval （ ODPR ）に有効であることが示されています。 既存の研究は、ネガティブサンプリング戦略または追加の事前トレーニングを改善することによって、さらなる最適化に焦点を当てています。 しかしながら、これらの研究は、不適切なモデリング粒度から内部表現の矛盾を伴う通過を捕捉することにおいて未知であり続けている。 具体的には、複数の意味的に異なる文によってパッセージを構成することができるという我々の観察の下では、そのようなパッセージを統一された密度の高いベクトルとしてモデリングすることは最適ではない。 したがって、この研究は、より小さな粒度、文脈文に基づいて、懸念される対立を緩和するための洗練されたモデルを提示する。 詳細には、同じパッセージ内の多様な生成された文章表現を奨励するために、パッセージ内ネガティブサンプリング戦略を導入します。 3つのベンチマークデータセットの実験は、特に競合が激しいデータセットで、当社の方法の有効性を検証します。 広範な実験は、データセット間での当社の方法の良好な転送性をさらに提示します。', 'hi': 'Contrastive Learning के माध्यम से सघन मार्ग अभ्यावेदन प्रशिक्षण को Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR) के लिए प्रभावी दिखाया गया है। मौजूदा अध्ययन नकारात्मक नमूना रणनीति या अतिरिक्त प्रीट्रेनिंग में सुधार करके आगे अनुकूलन पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हालांकि, ये अध्ययन अनुचित मॉडलिंग ग्रैन्युलैरिटी से आंतरिक प्रतिनिधित्व संघर्षों के साथ मार्ग पर कब्जा करने में अज्ञात रहते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हमारे अवलोकन के तहत कि एक मार्ग को कई शब्दार्थ रूप से अलग-अलग वाक्यों द्वारा व्यवस्थित किया जा सकता है, एक एकीकृत घने वेक्टर के रूप में इस तरह के मार्ग को मॉडलिंग करना इष्टतम नहीं है। इस प्रकार यह काम संबंधित संघर्षों को कम करने के लिए एक छोटे ग्रैन्युलैरिटी, प्रासंगिक वाक्यों के आधार पर एक परिष्कृत मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है। विस्तार से, हम एक ही मार्ग के भीतर वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व की एक विविध पीढ़ी को प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए एक इन-पैसेज नकारात्मक नमूना रणनीति पेश करते हैं। तीन बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोग हमारी विधि की प्रभावकारिता को सत्यापित करते हैं, खासकर डेटासेट पर जहां संघर्ष गंभीर होते हैं। व्यापक प्रयोग आगे डेटासेट में हमारी विधि की अच्छी हस्तांतरणीयता प्रस्तुत करते हैं।', 'zh': '比学密道,明验(ODPR)验。 今考侧重于改进负采样策额外预练以益优化。 然其治得因建模粒度不当而冲突者犹未知也。 具体来说以吾观之,一段落可以多语义异句,将此段落建模为一统之密向量非至善也。 是以其事小粒度,上下文句,立一改模,以轻相关。 详引一段落内非抽样策,以劝同段落之异。 三准集上实验验吾法之有效性,特在冲突之数集上。 博实验益明吾法于数集之间可转移性。', 'ru': 'Тренировочные представления плотных пассажей с помощью контрастного обучения оказались эффективными для извлечения пассажей открытого домена (ODPR). Существующие исследования направлены на дальнейшую оптимизацию путем совершенствования стратегии отрицательного отбора проб или дополнительной предварительной подготовки. Тем не менее, эти исследования сохраняют неизвестность в захвате пассажа с внутренними конфликтами представления от неправильной детализации моделирования. В частности, под нашим наблюдением, что проход может быть организован несколькими семантически разными предложениями, моделирование такого прохода как унифицированный плотный вектор не является оптимальным. Таким образом, эта работа представляет собой усовершенствованную модель, основанную на меньшей детализации, контекстуальных предложениях, для смягчения соответствующих конфликтов. В деталях мы вводим стратегию негативной выборки в пассаже, чтобы стимулировать разнообразное поколение представлений предложений в одном и том же пассаже. Эксперименты на трех эталонных наборах данных подтверждают эффективность нашего метода, особенно на наборах данных, где конфликты являются серьезными. Обширные эксперименты также демонстрируют хорошую переносимость нашего метода между наборами данных.', 'ga': 'Léiríodh go bhfuil éifeacht le hoiliúint léirithe dlúth pasáiste trí fhoghlaim chodarsnachta maidir le hAisghabháil Pasáiste Fearainn Oscailte (ODPR). Díríonn staidéir atá ann cheana féin ar bharrfheabhsú breise a dhéanamh trí straitéis samplála diúltach nó réamhoiliúint bhreise a fheabhsú. Mar sin féin, ní fios na staidéir seo maidir le sliocht a ghabháil le coinbhleachtaí ionadaíochta inmheánacha ó ghráinneacht samhaltaithe míchuí. Go sonrach, faoinár mbreathnú gur féidir sliocht a eagrú de réir abairtí iolracha atá difriúil ó thaobh semantice, níl sé optamach sliocht den sórt sin a shamhaltú mar veicteoir dlúth aontaithe. Mar sin cuireann an obair seo múnla scagtha i láthair ar bhonn níos lú gráinneachta, abairtí comhthéacsúla, chun na coinbhleachtaí lena mbaineann a mhaolú. Go mion, tugaimid isteach straitéis samplála diúltach laistigh den sliocht chun glúin ilghnéitheach léirithe pianbhreithe a spreagadh laistigh den sliocht céanna. Deimhníonn turgnaimh ar thrí thacar sonraí tagarmharcála éifeachtúlacht ár modh, go háirithe ar thacair sonraí ina bhfuil coinbhleachtaí trom. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing freisin inaistritheacht mhaith ár modha trasna tacair shonraí.', 'ka': 'საკონტრესტური სწავლების გამოყენებაში განახლება კონტრესტური სწავლების გამოყენებაში გამოყენებულია ეფექტიური საკონტრესტური მოსწავლებისთვის. Existing studies focus on further optimization by improving negative sampling strategy or extra pretraining. მაგრამ, ეს კვლევები არ უცნობიან, რომელიც ინტერესტრაციის კონფლიქტებით დაკავშირებული მოდელურობის განმავლობაში. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი მონაცემებისათვის რომ გადასვლა შეიძლება განსაკუთრებული სემენტიკურად განსხვავებული სიტყვების გამოყენება, როგორც ერთადერთიან დასვლებული გვქტორი არ არის ოპტიმა ეს სამუშაო ამიტომ ახალგაზრდა მოდელს, რომელიც ახალგაზრდა გრანუალურობის, კონტექსტური სიტყვების ბაზაზე, რომ შესახებ კონფლიქტების გახსნა. განსაზღვრებით, ჩვენ დავიყენებთ განსაზღვრებული სტრატიგია, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებით ერთი გადა სამი ბენქმარკური მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტები შემოწმება ჩვენი მეტის ეფექტიურობას, განსაკუთრებით მონაცემების კონფლიქტებზე, სადაც კონფ განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები უფრო ძალიან ჩვენი მეთოდის გადატანჟუმებელობას ჩვენი მონაცემენტების განმავლობაში.', 'el': 'Η εκπαίδευση αναπαραστάσεων πυκνών διαδρομών μέσω της αντιφατικής μάθησης έχει αποδειχθεί αποτελεσματική για την ανάκτηση διαβατηρίων ανοικτού τομέα (ODPR). Οι υπάρχουσες μελέτες επικεντρώνονται στην περαιτέρω βελτιστοποίηση μέσω της βελτίωσης της στρατηγικής αρνητικής δειγματοληψίας ή της επιπλέον προετοιμασίας. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι μελέτες παραμένουν άγνωστες στην καταγραφή του περάσματος με εσωτερικές συγκρούσεις αναπαράστασης από ακατάλληλη κοκκώτητα μοντελοποίησης. Συγκεκριμένα, υπό την παρατήρησή μας ότι ένα πέρασμα μπορεί να οργανωθεί από πολλαπλές σημασιολογικά διαφορετικές προτάσεις, η μοντελοποίηση ενός τέτοιου περάσματος ως ενοποιημένο πυκνό διάνυσμα δεν είναι βέλτιστη. Έτσι, η εργασία αυτή παρουσιάζει ένα εκλεπτυσμένο μοντέλο με βάση μια μικρότερη κοκκώτητα, περιεκτικές προτάσεις, για την ανακούφιση των σχετικών συγκρούσεων. Αναλυτικά, εισάγουμε μια στρατηγική αρνητικής δειγματοληψίας στο πέρασμα για να ενθαρρύνουμε μια διαφορετική γενιά αναπαραστάσεων προτάσεων στο ίδιο απόσπασμα. Τα πειράματα σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς επαληθεύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου μας, ειδικά σε σύνολα δεδομένων όπου οι συγκρούσεις είναι σοβαρές. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα παρουσιάζουν περαιτέρω καλή δυνατότητα μεταφοράς της μεθόδου μας σε σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'it': "L'addestramento di rappresentazioni dense di passaggio tramite apprendimento contrastante è stato dimostrato efficace per Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Gli studi esistenti si concentrano sull'ulteriore ottimizzazione migliorando la strategia di campionamento negativo o il pretraining extra. Tuttavia, questi studi rimangono sconosciuti nel catturare passaggi con conflitti di rappresentazione interna da granularità di modellazione impropria. Nello specifico, sotto la nostra osservazione che un passaggio può essere organizzato da più frasi semanticamente diverse, modellare un tale passaggio come un vettore denso unificato non è ottimale. Questo lavoro presenta quindi un modello raffinato sulla base di una granularità minore, frasi contestuali, per alleviare i conflitti interessati. In dettaglio, introduciamo una strategia di campionamento negativo nel passaggio per incoraggiare una generazione diversificata di rappresentazioni di frasi all'interno dello stesso passaggio. Esperimenti su tre set di dati benchmark verificano l'efficacia del nostro metodo, in particolare su set di dati in cui i conflitti sono gravi. Esperimenti approfonditi presentano inoltre una buona trasferibilità del nostro metodo tra i set di dati.", 'kk': 'Контрастырлық оқыту арқылы оқыту тұтықтық пайдаланулары Open- Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR) үшін эффективні көрсетілді. Бар зерттеулері негативті түрлендіру стратегиясын жақсартып, немесе қосымша түрлендіру арқылы қосымша оптимизациялауға көмектеседі. Бірақ бұл зерттеулердің ішкі келтірімдердің жарамсыз модельдік грануляриялығынан білмейді. Ескертуімізде, бірнеше семантикалық түрлі мәліметтер бойынша, біріктірілген жиілік векторының моделі болуы мүмкін емес. Бұл жұмыс жасалған қайшылықтарды көшірмелеу үшін кішкентай грануляриялық, контексті сөйлемелер негізінде түзетілген модель көрсетеді. Егжей- тегжейлі, біз бір жұмыс ішінде әртүрлі мәліметтерді таңдау үшін негативті мәліметтер баптау стратегиясын келтіреміз. Үш бағдарламалар деректер қорларының тәжірибесін тексеру әдісіміздің эффективнігін тексереді, осылақ қайшылықтар қатты деректер қорларында. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер деректер жиындарында өзіміздің әдімімізді жақсы аударуға болады.', 'mk': 'Тренингот на густите преноси преку контрастивно учење е покажан ефикасен за Отворено-доменско преземање на патиштата (ODPR). Постојаните студии се фокусираат на понатамошно оптимизирање со подобрување на негативната стратегија на примероци или екстра претренирање. Сепак, овие студии остануваат непознати во заземањето на премин со конфликти на внатрешна претстава од неправилна моделирачка грануларност. Специфично, под нашата набљудување дека преминот може да биде организиран со повеќе семантично различни реченици, моделирањето на таков премин како единствен густ вектор не е оптимално. Оваа работа така претставува финиран модел на основа на помала грануларност, контекстни реченици, за олеснување на загрижените конфликти. Во детали, воведуваме негативна стратегија за примерок во текот на преминот за да охрабриме различна генерација на претставувања на казните во истиот премин. Експериментите на три бази на податоци ја потврдуваат ефикасноста на нашиот метод, особено на базите на податоци каде конфликтите се сериозни. Експериментите понатаму претставуваат добра трансферибилност на нашиот метод преку податоци.', 'hu': 'A kontrasztív tanulással történő sűrű átjárási reprezentációk képzése hatékonynak bizonyult az Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). A meglévő tanulmányok a negatív mintavételi stratégia javításával vagy az extra előkészítéssel történő további optimalizálásra összpontosítanak. Ezek a tanulmányok azonban ismeretlenek maradnak a nem megfelelő modellezési granularitásból eredő belső reprezentációs konfliktusok rögzítésében. Konkrétan, megfigyelésünk szerint egy áthaladás több szemantikailag különböző mondattal is szervezhető, egy ilyen áthaladás egységes sűrű vektorként való modellezése nem optimális. Ez a munka így egy kisebb részletességű, kontextuális mondatokon alapuló finomított modellt mutat be az érintett konfliktusok enyhítésére. Részletesen bevezetünk egy passzív negatív mintavételi stratégiát, hogy ösztönözzük a mondatok ábrázolásának különböző generációját ugyanazon ponton belül. Három benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérletek igazolják módszerünk hatékonyságát, különösen olyan adatkészleteken, ahol súlyos konfliktusok vannak. A kiterjedt kísérletek továbbá a módszerünk jó átvihetőségét mutatják az adatkészletek között.', 'ms': 'Latihan perwakilan laluan padat melalui pembelajaran kontras telah dipaparkan berkesan untuk Pemulihan Laluan Domain terbuka (ODPR). Ujian yang wujud fokus pada optimizasi lanjut dengan meningkatkan strategi penerimaan sampel negatif atau pratelajaran tambahan. However, these studies keep unknown in capturing passage with internal representation conflicts from improper modeling granularity.  Specifically, under our observation that a passage can be organized by multiple semantically different sentences, modeling such a passage as a unified dense vector is not optimal.  Kerja ini memperlihatkan model yang diperbaiki berdasarkan granulariti yang lebih kecil, kalimat kontekstual, untuk mengurangi konflik yang bimbang. Secara terperinci, kami memperkenalkan strategi pengumpulan negatif dalam laluan untuk mendorong generasi pelbagai perwakilan kalimat dalam laluan yang sama. Eksperimen pada tiga set data benchmark mengesahkan kegunaan kaedah kami, terutama pada set data di mana konflik adalah berat. Eksperimen lanjut menunjukkan kemampuan pemindahan kaedah kita melalui set data.', 'ml': 'തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പാസ്സേജ് വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്ഥ്യം പ നിലവിലുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d നെഗറേറ്റീവ് മാമ്പിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന ഗ്രാജ്യം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനാലോ കൂടുതല്\u200d പെയ്യാ എന്നാലും ഈ പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d അപരിചിതമായി പിടികൂടുന്നതില്\u200d അസാധുവായ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും അസാധുവായ മോഡല പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ നോട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പാസ്സേജ് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഒരു സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു യൂണിക്കൂ അതുകൊണ്ട് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ചെറിയ ഗ്രാനസ്ത്രീയത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ഒരു മോഡലിനെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത വിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പാസ്സേജിലെ നെഗേറ്റീവ് മാമ്പ്ലിങ്ങ് കാണിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ട്രാക്ടിജി പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന മൂന്നു ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളെ ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നു. പ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയിലെ നല്ല മാറ്റമാക്കുന്നത് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലൂടെയാണ്.', 'lt': 'Įrodyta, kad mokymo tankis pasitraukimas naudojant kontrastinį mokymąsi yra veiksmingas atvirojo domeno keleivių atgavimui (ODPR). Dabartiniuose tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama tolesniam optimizavimui gerinant neigiamą mėginių ėmimo strategiją arba papildomą išankstinį mokymą. Vis dėlto šie tyrimai nežinomi dėl netinkamo modeliavimo granuliarumo, kai vidaus reprezentacijos konfliktai pasitaiko. Specifically, under our observation that a passage can be organized by multiple semantically different sentences, modeling such a passage as a unified dense vector is not optimal.  Taigi šiame darbe pateikiamas patobulintas modelis, grindžiamas mažesniu granuliarumu, kontekstiniais sakiniais, siekiant sušvelninti susijusius konfliktus. Išsamiai įvedame neigiamą mėginių ėmimo strategiją, kuria siekiama skatinti skirtingą sakinių kartą toje pačioje dalyje. Trijų lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai tikrina mūsų metodo veiksmingumą, ypač duomenų rinkiniuose, kuriuose yra dideli konfliktai. Išsamūs eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas yra gerai perduodamas į duomenų rinkinius.', 'mt': 'It-taħriġ ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet densi ta’ passaġġi permezz ta’ tagħlim kontrastiv intwera effettiv għall-kisba ta’ passaġġi f’Dominju Miftuħ (Open-Domain Passage Retrieval, ODPR). L-istudji eżistenti jiffukaw fuq l-ottimizzazzjoni ulterjuri billi jtejbu l-istrateġija negattiva tat-teħid ta’ kampjuni jew it-taħriġ minn qabel addizzjonali. However, these studies keep unknown in capturing passage with internal representation conflicts from improper modeling granularity.  Speċifikament, taħt l-osservazzjoni tagħna li passaġġ jista’ jiġi organizzat minn sentenzi semantikament differenti multipli, l-immudellar ta’ passaġġ bħal vettur dens unifikat mhuwiex ottimali. Dan ix-xogħol għalhekk jippreżenta mudell raffinat abbażi ta’ granularità iżgħar, sentenzi kuntestwali, biex jittaffew il-kunflitti kkonċernati. Fid-dettall, a ħna nintroduċu strateġija ta’ teħid ta’ kampjuni negattiv waqt il-passaġġ biex in ħeġġu ġenerazzjoni diversifikata ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet tas-sentenzi fl-istess passaġġ. L-esperimenti fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ referenza jivverifikaw l-effikaċja tal-metodu tagħna, speċjalment fuq settijiet ta’ dejta fejn il-kunflitti huma severi. Esperimenti estensivi jippreżentaw aktar trasferibbiltà tajba tal-metodu tagħna fis-settijiet tad-dejta.', 'mn': 'Өөрчлөгдөлтэй сургалтын аргаар дасгал хөдөлгөөн үзүүлэлт нь Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR) дээр үр дүнтэй харагдсан. Existing studies on further optimization by improving negative sample strategy or extra pretraining. Гэвч эдгээр судалгаанууд дотоод үзүүлэлтийн зөрчилдөөнд буруу загварын гранулалыг барьж байдаг. Ялангуяа бидний ажиглаж байгаагаар хэд хэдэн семантийн өөр өгүүлбэрээр цааш зохион байгуулах боломжтой. Нэгдсэн жингийн вектор шиг загвар зохион байгуулах нь эерэг биш. Энэ үйл ажиллагаа нь бага зэрэгцээ, орчин үеийн жижиг хэлбэрүүдийн үндсэн жижиг загварын загварыг харуулдаг. Тодорхой хэлбэрээр бид адилхан дагуулын дотор олон үеийн үзүүлэлтийг дэмжихийн тулд хасах сөрөг арга барилгын арга барилгын стратегийг танилцуулдаг. Гурван банк өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд бидний арга замын үр дүнтэй байдлыг шалгаж, ялангуяа зөрчилдөөнд маш чухал өгөгдлийн санг шалгаж байна. Өнгөрсөн туршилтууд өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр бидний аргыг сайн дамжуулах боломжтой болгодог.', 'no': 'Øvingsrepresentasjonar av tett passasjon gjennom kontrastlæring er vist effektivt for Open-Domain Passage Retrieving (ODPR). Dette eksisterande studier fokuserer på framover optimalisering ved å forbetra negativ samplingsstrategi eller ekstra trekk. Desse studiane gjer imidlertid ukjende i å henta passasjon med interne representasjonskontrollar frå ugyldig modelleringsgranularitet. Spesielt, under observasjonen vår at eit passage kan organiserast av fleire semantisk ulike setningar. Dette er ikkje optimal å modelera eit passage som ein einaste tettvektor. Dette arbeidet viser derfor ein refinert modell på grunn av ein mindre granularitet, kontekst setningar, for å redusera dei oppgjevne konfliktene. Detaljar introduserer vi ein negativ samlingsstrategi for å oppfordre ein forskjellig generasjon av setningssrepresentasjonar i same passage. Eksperimentar på tre benchmarkdatasett kontrollerer effektiviteten av metoden vårt, spesielt på datasett der konfliktar er vanskeleg. Ekstra eksperimenter viser framover godt overføringsfeilighet av metoden vårt over datasett.', 'ro': 'Instruirea reprezentărilor dense ale pasajelor prin învățare contrastantă s-a dovedit eficientă pentru recuperarea pasajelor Open-Domain (ODPR). Studiile existente se concentrează pe optimizarea suplimentară prin îmbunătățirea strategiei de eșantionare negativă sau pre-pregătire suplimentară. Cu toate acestea, aceste studii rămân necunoscute în captarea pasajelor cu conflicte de reprezentare internă din granularitatea necorespunzătoare de modelare. Mai exact, sub observația noastră că un pasaj poate fi organizat prin mai multe propoziții semantic diferite, modelarea unui astfel de pasaj ca un vector dens unificat nu este optimă. Această lucrare prezintă astfel un model rafinat bazat pe o granularitate mai mică, fraze contextuale, pentru atenuarea conflictelor în cauză. În detaliu, introducem o strategie de eșantionare negativă în pasaj pentru a încuraja o generație diversă de reprezentări ale frazelor în cadrul aceluiași pasaj. Experimentele pe trei seturi de date de referință verifică eficacitatea metodei noastre, în special pe seturi de date în care conflictele sunt severe. Experimentele extinse prezintă în continuare o bună transferabilitate a metodei noastre între seturi de date.', 'sr': 'Predstavljanja gustih prolaza za obuku putem kontrastivnog učenja pokazala je efikasna za otvoreno domenu prikupljanje prolaza (ODPR). Postoje studije fokusiraju se na daljnju optimizaciju poboljšavajući negativnu strategiju za uzorke ili dodatnu pretkišenje. Međutim, ove studije nastavljaju nepoznati u hvatanju prolaza sa konfliktima unutrašnjeg zastupanja od nepravedne granularnosti modela. Posebno, pod našim posmatranjem da prolaz može biti organizovan višesemantički različitim rečenicama, modeliranje takvih prolaza kao ujedinjeni gusti vektor nije optimalno. Ovaj rad tako predstavlja rafinirani model na osnovu manje granularnosti, kontekstualne rečenice, kako bi olakšao odgovarajuće sukobe. Detaljno, predstavljamo negativnu strategiju uzorka u prolazu kako bi poticali različite generacije predstavljanja rečenica u istom prolazu. Eksperimenti na tri standardna seta podataka potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg metode, posebno na setima podataka gde su konflikti teški. Eksperimenti dalje predstavljaju dobru prijenosnost naše metode preko seta podataka.', 'pl': 'Szkolenie gęstych reprezentacji przejść za pomocą uczenia się kontrastywnego okazało się skuteczne w Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Istniejące badania koncentrują się na dalszej optymalizacji poprzez poprawę strategii negatywnego próbkowania lub dodatkowego treningu wstępnego. Jednak badania te pozostają nieznane w uchwycaniu przejścia z wewnętrznymi konfliktami reprezentacyjnymi z niewłaściwej granularności modelowania. W szczególności, według naszej obserwacji, że fragment może być zorganizowany przez wiele różnych semantycznie zdań, modelowanie takiego fragmentu jako ujednoliconego gęstego wektora nie jest optymalne. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiono zatem dopracowany model oparty na mniejszej granularności, zdaniach kontekstowych, aby złagodzić zainteresowane konflikty. Szczegółowo wprowadzamy strategię negatywnego próbkowania w pasażu, aby zachęcić do różnorodnego pokolenia reprezentacji zdań w tym samym fragmencie. Eksperymenty na trzech zbiorach danych referencyjnych weryfikują skuteczność naszej metody, zwłaszcza na zbiorach danych, w których konflikty są poważne. Obszerne eksperymenty pokazują również dobrą możliwość przenoszenia naszej metody między zbiorami danych.', 'sv': 'Att träna täta passagerrepresentationer via kontrastivt lärande har visat sig vara effektivt för Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Befintliga studier fokuserar på ytterligare optimering genom att förbättra negativ provtagningsstrategi eller extra förberedelse. Dessa studier förblir dock okända när det gäller att fånga passage med interna representationskonflikter från felaktig modellering granularitet. Specifikt, under vår observation att en passage kan organiseras av flera semantiskt olika meningar, modellering av en sådan passage som en enhetlig tät vektor är inte optimal. Detta arbete presenterar således en förfinad modell baserad på en mindre granularitet, kontextuella meningar, för att lindra de berörda konflikterna. I detalj introducerar vi en negativ provtagningsstrategi i passagen för att uppmuntra en varierad generation av meningsrepresentationer inom samma passage. Experiment på tre benchmarkdatauppsättningar verifierar effektiviteten av vår metod, särskilt på datauppsättningar där konflikter är svåra. Omfattande experiment visar vidare god överförbarhet av vår metod över datauppsättningar.', 'ur': 'ٹرینینگ گہرے پاسٹ کی نمایش کنٹرسیٹ کی تعلیم کے ذریعے کھولنے والی دامین پاسٹ (ODPR) کے لئے اثری دکھائی گئی ہے۔ Existing studies focus on further optimization by improving negative sampling strategy or extra pretraining. However, these studies keep unknown in capturing passage with internal representation conflicts from improper modeling granularity. خاص طور پر، ہماری نظارت کے اندر یہ کہ ایک مسافر تعداد سیمنٹی طور پر مختلف جماعتوں کے ذریعہ تنظیم کر سکتا ہے، جس طرح ایک متحدہ گہرے ویکتور کے مطابق ایک مسافر کی مدل کرنا بہترین نہیں ہے. اسی طرح یہ کام ایک چھوٹی بڑائی، متوسط کلمات کی بنیاد پر ایک پاکیزہ موڈل پیش کرتا ہے کہ مشغول اختلاف کو کمزور کرے۔ ہم مفصل کے طور پر ایک مفصل منفی نمونہ نمونہ کا استراتژی پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک طرح طرح طرح کی نسل جماعت کی نمونہ ادھر کریں۔ تین بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ کے تجربے ہمارے طریقے کے مطابقت کی تصدیق کرتے ہیں، مخصوصا ڈیٹ سٹ پر جہاں اختلاف سخت ہیں. اور اضافہ آزمائش ہمارے طریقے کے بہترین انتقال قابلیت دکھاتے ہیں.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප ඉතින් තියෙන්නේ අධ්\u200dයානය අධ්\u200dයානය අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා නැති සැම්ප්ලීම් ස්ට්\u200dරේටික් විශේෂණය නමුත්, මේ අධ්\u200dයානය අඳුරන් තියෙන්නේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සමඟ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සමඟ අනතුරු  විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය අතර, පාස් එකක් වෙක්ටර් වලින් වෙනස් විදියට සැකසුම් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, මොඩේජ් වලින් එක්ක මේ වැඩේ ඉතින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්ම විස්තර වලින්, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන් විවිධ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න. බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නතාවක් සැකසුම, විශේෂයෙන්ම දත්ත ස විස්තර පරීක්ෂණය තවත් අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ දත්ත සේට් වලට හොඳ ස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada koorasyada baaritaanka ee gaaban waxaa lagu muujiyey mid faa’iido leh oo ku saabsan baaritaanka furan (ODPR). Waxbarashada soo socda waxay ku focus on horumarinta qoraalka sameynta negative ama dib u soo celinta. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashadan ma oga in la soo qabsado wadanka gudaha ah muran-qabsashada si aan loo sameyn karo tusaale ahaan. Si gaar ah, waxaan arkaynaa in baasaboor loo qaban karo hablo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, si loo sameynayo baasaboor sida wadajir ah oo aan u dhaqdhaqaaqsanayn. Sida darteed shuqulkaas waxaa soo saara tusaale la saxeeyey oo ku saleysan cimri yar, xarumaha joogtada ah, si uu u fududeeyo dagaalladaha la xiriira. Si gaar ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qoraal sameynta negative ah si a an u dhiirrigelino qarni kala duduwan oo xafiiska isku baaxada. Experiments on three benchmark datasets verify the efficacy of our method, especially on datasets where conflicts are severe.  Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo sii dheeraad ah ayaa qaab wanaagsan oo qaabkeenna ku bedelaya sawirada.', 'ta': 'மாறுபாடு கற்றுக்கொண்டு திறந்த களம் கடவுச்சொல் திரும்பச் செலுத்தலுக்கு தெளிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. தற்போதைய ஆய்வுகள் எதிர்மறை மாதிரி துண்டுகளை மேம்படுத்தி அல்லது கூடுதல் மழையை மேம்படுத்தி மேலும் மேம்படுத ஆனால், இந்த படிப்பாடுகள் செல்லாத மாதிரி உருவாக்கத்திலிருந்து தெரியாத கடவுச்செல்லும் பிடித்துக் கொண்ட குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் பார்வையில் ஒரு கடவுச்செல்ல முடியும் பல வாக்கியங்களால் நிறுவப்படுத்தலாம், ஒரு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட அடர்த்தி நெறிய இந்த வேலை தேவைப்பட்ட குழப்பங்களை எளிதாக்குவதற்கான சிறிய சிறிய சார்ந்த சார்ந்த வாக்கியங்களை அடிப்படையில் ஒரு சுரு விவரமாக, நாம் கடவுச் செல்லும் எதிர்ம ம மாதிரி திட்டத்தை முன்னேற்றுகிறோம், ஒரே கடவுச்செல்லும் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தின் ப மூன்று பென்மார்க் தரவுத்தளத்தில் சோதனைகள் முறைமையின் விளைவை சரிபார் விரிவான சோதனைகள் தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு மேலும் நல்ல முறைமையை மாற்றும்.', 'uz': "Name Mavjud o'qituvlar negativ sampling strategini yaxshi ko'proq o'zgartirish orqali aniqlashga foydalanadi. Lekin, bu o'qituvlar ichki taʼminlovchi murakkablarni muvaffaqiyatli model modelidagi murakkablarni olishda nomaʼlum qoladi. Ko'rsatilgan, bizning taqdimotimizda, maxfiy soʻz bir necha nechta so'zlar bilan boshqarishi mumkin, bir necha nechta so'zlar bilan boshqarish mumkin, bir nechta bogʻ'liq va bir nechta vector emas. Bu ishni tahrirlash modeli muammolari murakkablarini kamaytirish uchun kichkina granulik, davomida so'zlar asosida yaratish mumkin. Biz bir xil maxfiy soʻzning bir xil bir xil bir xil bir xil qoidalarni amalga oshirish uchun negativ samol strategini anglatamiz. Uchta benchmark maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi imtiyozlarimizning metodimizning effektini tekshirish, hususan murakkab darajali maʼlumotlar tarkibida. Koʻproq tajribalar maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi metodemizning yaxshi o'zgarishlarimizga ega.", 'vi': 'Kỹ thuật huấn luyện đường mật qua học tương phản đã được cho thấy hiệu quả với vòng vây thông hành rộng mở (OPR). Các nghiên cứu hiện thời tập trung vào việc tăng cường độ tốt bằng cách cải thiện chiến lược chọn tiêu cực hoặc tăng cường sản xuất. Tuy nhiên, những nghiên cứu này vẫn chưa được xác định khi bắt giữ lối đi với sự phân biệt nội bộ từ việc u hạt xấu. Cụ thể, theo quan sát của chúng ta rằng một lối đi có thể được tổ chức bởi nhiều câu ngữ nghĩa khác nhau, tạo ra một lối đi như một véc- tơ đặc biệt không phải là tối ưu tiên. Việc này mang đến một mô hình tinh xảo hơn, dựa trên độ hạt nhỏ, các câu lặp lại, để giảm các xung đột liên quan. Chúng tôi sẽ đưa ra một chiến lược tiêu cực trong đoạn để khuyến khích hàng loạt các đài phát biểu hình phạt trong cùng một đoạn. Thí nghiệm trên ba tập tin tiêu chuẩn xác thực hiệu quả của phương pháp này, đặc biệt là trên các tập tin dữ liệu có xung đột nghiêm trọng. Các thí nghiệm rộng lớn có khả năng chuyển giao tốt cho phương pháp của chúng tôi.', 'da': 'Træning af tætte passagerrepræsentationer via kontrastiv læring har vist sig effektiv til Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Eksisterende undersøgelser fokuserer på yderligere optimering ved at forbedre negativ prøvetagningsstrategi eller ekstra forudtræning. Disse undersøgelser holder sig imidlertid ukendte i at fange passage med interne repræsentationskonflikter fra forkert modellering granularitet. Specielt, under vores observation, at en passage kan organiseres af flere semantisk forskellige sætninger, modellering af en sådan passage som en samlet tæt vektor er ikke optimal. Dette arbejde præsenterer således en raffineret model baseret på en mindre granularitet, kontekstuelle sætninger, for at afhjælpe de pågældende konflikter. I detaljer introducerer vi en negativ prøveudtagningsstrategi i passagen for at fremme en forskellig generation af sætningsrepræsentationer inden for samme passage. Eksperimenter på tre benchmark datasæt bekræfter effektiviteten af vores metode, især på datasæt, hvor konflikter er alvorlige. Omfattende eksperimenter viser yderligere god overførbarhed af vores metode på tværs af datasæt.', 'bg': 'Обучението на гъсти пасажи чрез контрастивно обучение е доказано ефективно за извличане на пасажи с отворен домейн (ODPR). Съществуващите проучвания се фокусират върху по-нататъшното оптимизиране чрез подобряване на негативната стратегия за вземане на проби или допълнително предварително обучение. Въпреки това, тези изследвания остават неизвестни при улавянето на пасаж с вътрешно представяне конфликти от неправилно моделиране гранулираност. По-конкретно, при нашето наблюдение, че един пасаж може да бъде организиран от множество семантично различни изречения, моделирането на такъв пасаж като единен плътен вектор не е оптимално. По този начин тази работа представя усъвършенстван модел въз основа на по-малка гранулираност, контекстуални изречения, за облекчаване на засегнатите конфликти. В детайли въвеждаме стратегия за отрицателно вземане на проби в пасажа, за да насърчим разнообразно поколение изображения на изречения в рамките на един и същ пасаж. Експериментите с три сравнителни набора данни потвърждават ефикасността на нашия метод, особено при набори от данни, при които конфликтите са тежки. Обширните експерименти допълнително показват добра преносимост на нашия метод между набори от данни.', 'hr': 'Predstavljanja gustih prolaza za obuku kroz kontrastivno učenje pokazala je učinkovito za otvoreno prikupljanje prolaza domena (ODPR). Postoje ispitivanja fokusiraju se na daljnju optimizaciju poboljšavajući negativnu strategiju za uzorak uzorka ili dodatnu pretkivanje. Međutim, ovi ispitivanja nastavljaju nepoznati u uhvaćenju prolaza s sukoba unutarnjeg zastupanja od nepravedne granularnosti modela. Posebno, pod našim promatranjem da prolaz može biti organiziran višesemantički različitim rečenicama, modeliranje takvih prolaza kao ujedinjeni gusti vektor nije optimalno. Ovaj rad tako predstavlja rafinirani model na temelju manje granularnosti, suvremenih rečenica, kako bi se smanjila odgovarajući sukobi. Detaljno, predstavljamo negativnu strategiju uzimanja uzoraka u prolazu kako bi poticali različite generacije predstavljanja kazne u istom prolazu. Eksperimenti na tri seta podataka o referenciji potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg metoda, posebno na setovima podataka gdje su konflikti teški. Prošireni eksperimenti dalje predstavljaju dobru prijenosnost naše metode preko seta podataka.', 'nl': 'Het trainen van dichte passage representaties via contrastief leren is effectief gebleken voor Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Bestaande studies richten zich op verdere optimalisatie door het verbeteren van negatieve sampling strategie of extra pretraining. Deze studies blijven echter onbekend in het vastleggen van passage met interne representatieconflicten van onjuiste modelleringsgranulariteit. Specifiek, onder onze observatie dat een passage kan worden georganiseerd door meerdere semantisch verschillende zinnen, is het modelleren van een passage als een verenigde dichte vector niet optimaal. Dit werk presenteert zo een verfijnd model op basis van een kleinere granulariteit, contextuele zinnen, om de betrokken conflicten te verlichten. In detail introduceren we een in-passage negatieve sampling strategie om een diverse generatie zinnen representaties binnen dezelfde passage aan te moedigen. Experimenten met drie benchmark datasets verifiëren de effectiviteit van onze methode, vooral op datasets waar conflicten ernstig zijn. Uitgebreide experimenten tonen verder een goede overdraagbaarheid van onze methode over datasets.', 'de': 'Das Training von dichten Passagen mittels kontrastivem Lernen hat sich für Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR) als effektiv erwiesen. Bestehende Studien konzentrieren sich auf die weitere Optimierung durch Verbesserung der negativen Stichprobenstrategie oder zusätzliches Vortraining. Allerdings bleiben diese Studien bei der Erfassung von Passagen mit internen Repräsentationskonflikten aus unsachgemäßer Modellierungsgranularität unbekannt. Insbesondere unter unserer Beobachtung, dass eine Passage durch mehrere semantisch unterschiedliche Sätze organisiert werden kann, ist die Modellierung einer solchen Passage als einheitlicher dichter Vektor nicht optimal. Diese Arbeit präsentiert daher ein verfeinertes Modell auf der Grundlage einer kleineren Granularität, kontextueller Sätze, um die betroffenen Konflikte zu lindern. Im Detail führen wir eine negative Stichprobenstrategie in Passage ein, um eine vielfältige Generation von Satzdarstellungen innerhalb derselben Passage zu fördern. Experimente an drei Benchmark-Datensätzen belegen die Wirksamkeit unserer Methode, insbesondere an Datensätzen, bei denen Konflikte schwerwiegend sind. Umfangreiche Experimente zeigen zudem eine gute Übertragbarkeit unserer Methode über Datensätze hinweg.', 'ko': '비교 학습 훈련이 밀집된 단락 표징을 통해 개방역 단락 검색(ODPR)에 효과적이다.기존의 연구는 마이너스 샘플링 전략을 개선하거나 추가 예훈련을 통해 더욱 최적화하는 데 중심을 두었다.그러나 이러한 연구는 모델링의 입도가 부적절하여 발생하는 내부 표시 충돌을 포착할 때 여전히 알 수 없다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리의 관찰에 따르면 한 문장은 여러 가지 의미가 다른 문장으로 구성될 수 있는데 이런 문장을 하나의 통일된 밀집 벡터로 모델링하는 것이 가장 좋은 것은 아니다.따라서 이 작업은 더욱 작은 입도, 상하문 문장을 바탕으로 하는 개선 모델을 제시하여 관련 충돌을 완화시켰다.상세하게 말하자면 우리는 한 단락 내의 부정 표본 추출 전략을 도입하여 같은 단락 내에서 서로 다른 문장 표징이 생기도록 격려했다.세 가지 기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리 방법의 유효성을 검증했고 특히 충돌이 심각한 데이터 집합에서 검증했다.대량의 실험은 우리의 방법이 서로 다른 데이터 집합 사이의 양호한 이식성을 한층 더 증명하였다.', 'id': 'Pelatihan representation daya lewat melalui pembelajaran kontras telah menunjukkan efektif untuk Pemulihan Passage Open-Domain (ODPR). Studi yang ada fokus pada optimisasi lanjut dengan meningkatkan strategi sampel negatif atau perkelahian ekstra. Namun, penelitian-penelitian ini tetap tidak diketahui dalam menangkap laluan dengan konflik representation interna dari granularitas model yang tidak tepat. Secara spesifik, di bawah pengamatan kita bahwa sebuah bagian dapat diatur oleh beberapa kalimat yang berbeda secara semantis, memmodelkan bagian seperti vektor padat bersatu tidak optimal. Kerja ini dengan demikian mempersembahkan model yang dipersiapkan berdasarkan granularitas yang lebih kecil, kalimat kontekstual, untuk mengurangi konflik yang tertarik. Dalam rincian, kami memperkenalkan strategi sampel negatif dalam perjalanan untuk mendorong generasi berbagai represensi kalimat dalam perjalanan yang sama. Eksperimen pada tiga set data benchmark mengkonfirmasi efektivitas metode kita, terutama pada set data di mana konflik yang berat. Eksperimen ekstensif lebih lanjut menunjukkan transferabilitas yang baik dari metode kita melalui set data.', 'fa': 'تعلیم نمایش\u200cهای مسیر داغی با طریق یادگیری متفاوتی برای بازیابی مسیر باز دامنی (ODPR) نشان داده شده است. مطالعه\u200cهای موجود روی بهترین کردن بیشتری با بهترین استراتژی نمونه\u200cهای منفی یا تحریک اضافی تمرکز می\u200cکند. با این حال، این مطالعه\u200cها در دستگیر گذشته\u200cهای داخلی با اختلافات نمایش\u200cهای داخلی از نمایش نمونه\u200cهای غیرقابل شناخته می\u200cشوند. مخصوصا، تحت نظر ما که یک سفر می\u200cتواند با جمله\u200cهای متفاوت چند semantically متفاوت تنظیم شود، مانند یک سفر مانند یک vektor dense unified optimal نیست. این کار به همین دلیل یک مدل اصلاح شده را بر اساس یک جمله بزرگی کوچکتر، جمله\u200cهای متوسط نشان می\u200cدهد تا مبارزه\u200cها را کمتر کند. در جزئیات، ما یک استراتژی نمونه\u200cهای منفی در گذشته برای تشویق به نسل\u200cهای مختلف جمله\u200cها در یک گذشته معرفی می\u200cکنیم. تجربه\u200cهایی روی سه مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای نقشه\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی\u200cبندی روش ما را ثابت می\u200cکند، مخصوصا روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cبندی\u200cها که اختلاف\u200cها سخت آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای بیشتر قابلیت انتقال خوب از روش\u200cهای ما را در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Training dense passage representations via contrastive learning has been shown effective for Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR).  Utafiti unaoendelea unajikita zaidi kwa kuboresha mkakati wa sampuli hasi au kutengeneza mvua zaidi. Hata hivyo, tafiti hizi zinaendelea kutokufahamu katika kuchukua upatikanaji na migogoro ya uwakilishaji wa ndani kutokana na utoaji mifano yasiyo sahihi. Kwa ujumla, chini ya mtazamo wetu kwamba upepo unaweza kuandaliwa na sentensi mbalimbali tofauti tofauti za kisiasa, kuonyesha upepo kama vile vector yenye umoja si optimal. Kazi hii inaonyesha muundo uliotayarishwa kwa msingi wa uchunguzi mdogo, sentensi za kawaida, ili kupunguza migogoro yanayohusiana. Kwa kina, tunaonyesha mkakati wenye sampuli hasi ili kuwahamasisha kizazi tofauti cha uwakilishi wa hukumu ndani ya kipindi hicho. Majaribio kwenye taarifa tatu za bendera yanathibitisha ufanisi wa njia yetu, hususani kwenye seti za taarifa ambapo migogoro ni ngumu. Majaribio mengi yanaleta uhamishaji mzuri wa njia yetu kupitia seti za data.', 'tr': 'Aç-Domain Geçimlerini (ODPR) üçin eýilleşik öwrenmek üçin ýigrenç ýüze geçiş temsilleri görkezildi. Öň bar öňki aramalar negatif näme etmek stratejiýasyny gowasarak, ýa-da aşka döretmäge köpräk ukyplamak üçin gowy gözleýär. Bu araştırmalar iç çarpışynda bilinmedikleri şekilde düzgün modellendirmek üçin çatışmalar şeklinde tutuyorlar. Adatça, gözlerimizde geçiş çarpımı semantik olarak farklı sözler tarafından düzenleyebilir, bir yoğun vektör gibi örneklendirmek optimal degil. Şonuň üçin bu işi, kiçi bir ýagdaý, contest sözleriň esasynda taýýarlanan bir nusga görkezýär. Ayrıntılı olarak, bir geçiş içinde farklı cümlelerin temsillerini önermek için negatif örnek alma stratejisini tanıtıyoruz. Üç benchmark veri setirinde synanyşlar biziň metodamyzyň etkinliýetini barlaýarlar, ýöne veri setirlerinde konfliktler çykyş bolan ýerde. Döwletler üçin mektuplarymyzyň üstünde gowy göçürligi ukyplaryny görkez.', 'af': "Onderwysing dens wagwoord voorstellings deur kontrastiewe leer is gewys effektief vir Open- Domein Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Bestaande studies fokus op verdere optimaliseering deur negatiewe versameling strategie of ekstra versameling te verbeter. Hierdie studie hou tog onbekende in die opvang van pasmaak met interne verskyning konflikte van verkeerde modellering granulariteit. Spesifieke, onder ons observasie dat 'n wagsaak kan organiseer word deur veelvuldige semantiese verskillende setinge, modelering soos 'n wagsaak as 'n eenvoudige dens vektor is nie optimal nie. Hierdie werk so stel 'n opgewerkte model op die basis van 'n kleiner granulariteit, contextual setings om die betrokke konflikte te verminder. In detail, ons introduseer 'n negatiewe versameling strategie om 'n verskeie generasie van setinge voorstellings binne dieselfde pad te bevestig. Eksperimente op drie benchmarkdatastelle bevestig die effektiviteit van ons metode, veral op datastelle waar konflikte swaar is. Ekstensiewe eksperimente verder voorsien goeie oordragbare van ons metode oor datastelle.", 'sq': 'Trenimi i përfaqësimeve të dendura të pasazheve nëpërmjet mësimit kontrastiv është treguar efektiv për marrjen e pasazheve në domeni të hapur (ODPR). Studimet ekzistuese përqëndrohen në optimizimin e mëtejshëm duke përmirësuar strategjinë negative të mbikqyrjes ose përpara stërvitjes shtesë. Megjithatë, këto studime mbajnë të panjohura në kapjen e pasazhit me konfliktet e përfaqësimit të brendshëm nga granulariteti i modelimit të papërshtatshëm. Specifically, under our observation that a passage can be organized by multiple semantically different sentences, modeling such a passage as a unified dense vector is not optimal.  Ky punë paraqet kështu një model të rafinuar mbi bazën e një granulariteti më të vogël, fjalëve kontekstuale, për të lehtësuar konfliktet e shqetësuara. Në detaj, ne futim një strategji mosmarrëveshjeje negative në kalim për të inkurajuar një gjeneratë të ndryshme përfaqësimesh të dënimeve brenda të njëjtës kalimi. Eksperimentet në tre baza të dhënash kontrollojnë efektshmërinë e metodës sonë, veçanërisht në baza të dhënash ku konfliktet janë të ashpra. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara paraqesin më tej transferueshmëri të mirë të metodës sonë nëpër të dhënat.', 'am': 'የተቃውሞ ትምህርት በመግለጫው ማቀናጃ የተጠቃሚ የግልፅ መግለጫ መልዕክቶች በክፈት ዶሜን Passage Retrieval (ODPR) ጥቅም ሆኖአል፡፡ Existing studies focus on further optimizing by improving negative sampling strategy or extra pretraining.  ምንም እንኳን፣ እነዚህ ትምህርት ግንኙነት ከሀገር መልዕክት ጋር ግጭት በመያዝ አይታወቁም፡፡ በተለይም፣ ባለ ጠቅላላ መግቢያ በተለየ የተለየ ክፍሎች እንዲያስተካክሉ በተለየ፣ እንደተለያየ ጠቅላላ vector መተላለፊያ አይቻልም፡፡ ይህ ሥራ የግጭት ግጭት ለማሳየት ታናሽ ሽልማት፣ ሁኔታዊ ግንኙነትን ለመቀላቀል፣ ታናሽ ሽልማት፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነትን በመሠረት የተደረገ ሞዴል ያሳያል፡፡ በተለይታ፣ በተለያዩ የፍርድ ትውልድ ልዩ ትውልድ እናሳብቃለን፡፡ በሦስት benchmark ዳታዎች ላይ መፈተኛ የሥርዓታችንን ውጤት እንዲያረጋግጥ፣ በተለየ ግጭት ኃይለኛ በሚኖሩበት ዳታተሮች ላይ ነው፡፡ ከዳታ ሰርቨሮች የተሻለ የሥርዓታችንን ልማት የሚለውጥ ብዙ ፈተናዎች አግኝቷል፡፡', 'bn': 'বিরোধী শিক্ষার মাধ্যমে গভীর প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে ওপেন ডোমেইন প্যাসেজ পুনরুদ্ধার (ওডিপিআর)। বর্তমান গবেষণা নেতিবাচক নমুনা কৌশল বা অতিরিক্ত ভাবে বৃষ্টি করার মাধ্যমে আরো উন্নতির দিকে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। তবে এই গবেষণাগুলো অজানা থাকে যে অভ্যন্তরীণ প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে সংঘর্ষের সাথে গ্রানুলারিটি থেকে অসম্ভব। বিশেষ করে, আমাদের পর্যবেক্ষণের অধীনে যে বেশ কয়েকটি সেম্পেন্টিক্যালের বিভিন্ন বাক্য দ্বারা একটি পাসেজ আয়োজন করা যাবে, যেহেতু একটি একত্রিত এই কাজের কারণে একটি সংশোধনীয় মডেল উপস্থাপন করে যাতে সংশ্লিষ্ট সংঘর্ষ কমিয়ে দেয়া যায়। বিস্তারিত ভাবে আমরা একটি প্যাসেজ নেতিবাচক ক কৌশল পরিচালনা করেছি একই পাসের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন প্রজন্মের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য ব তিনটি বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা আমাদের পদ্ধতির কার্যকর পরীক্ষা নিশ্চিত করে, বিশেষ করে ডাটাসেটে যেখানে সং আরো বিশাল পরীক্ষা আমাদের মাধ্যমের ভালো পরিবর্তনের উপস্থাপন করছে।', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ հակադրական ուսումնասիրության միջոցով խիտ անցքի պատկերացումները արդյունավետ են ցույց տվել բաց բնագավառի անցքի վերադարձման համար: Գոյություն ունի ուսումնասիրություններ, որոնք կենտրոնանում են առավելագույն օպտիմացման վրա՝ բարելավելով բացասական նմուշների ընդունման ռազմավարությունը կամ ավելին նախադասությունը: However, these studies keep unknown in capturing passage with internal representation conflicts from improper modeling granularity.  Հատկապես, մեր հետազոտության տակ, որ անցումը կարելի է կազմակերպել բազմաթիվ սեմանտիկ տարբեր նախադասություններով, մոդելավորելով այնպիսի անցումը, ինչպիսին միավորված խտության վեկտոր, օպտիմալ չէ: Այսպիսով, այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է բարելավված մոդել, որը հիմնված է ավելի փոքր գրանուլյարության, կոնտեքստիկ նախադասությունների վրա, որպեսզի նվազեցվի անհանգստացած հակամարտությունները: Մասնավորապես, մենք ներկայացնում ենք անցյալում բացասական նմուշների ընդունման ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի խրախուսենք նախադասությունների բազմազան սերունդը նույն անցյալում: Երեք համեմատական տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ստուգում են մեր մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը, հատկապես տվյալների համակարգերի, որտեղ հակամարտությունները լուրջ են: Ավելի լայն փորձարկումները ներկայացնում են մեր մեթոդի լավ փոխանցելիությունը տվյալների համակարգերի միջով:', 'az': 'Açıq-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR) üçün müxtəlif öyrənmək vasitəsilə təhsil edilən yox keçiş göstərilmələri göstərildi. Əvvəlki təhsil işləri negatif nümunə çəkmə stratejisini yaxşılaşdırmaq və yaxşılıq təhsil etmək üçün daha çox optimizlənmək üzərində odaqlanır. Ancaq bu təcrübələr dəyişdirilmiş modellik granularıyla dəyişdirilmiş döyüşə aparmaq üçün bilinmədilər. Özellikle, bizim gözlədiyimiz tərzdə keçiş çoxlu semantik fərqli cümlələr ilə organize edilə bilər, birlikdə yoxlu vektör kimi keçiş modelləri optimal deyil. Beləliklə, bu işin ən küçük granularlıq, müxtəlif cümlələr üzərində təmizlənmiş bir modeli göstərir ki, bu müxtəlif mübahisələri azaltsın. Biraz detaylı olaraq, biz bir çoxlu cümlələrlə birlikdə cümlələr göstərilməsini təşkil etmək üçün negatif nümunə çəkmə stratejisini təşkil edirik. Üç benchmark veri qurularında təcrübələr metodumuzun etkinliğini təsdiqləyir, özlərinə də konfliktlərin ağır olduğu veri qurularında. Daha çox uzaq eksperimentlər verilən qurğular arasında bizim metodumuzun yaxşı təkrarlanabiliyyətini göstərər.', 'ca': "S'ha demostrat que la formació de representacions denses de passatges a través de l'aprenentatge contrastiu és eficaç per a la recuperació de passatges de domini obert (ODPR). Els estudis existents es centren en la millora de l'estratègia negativa de recolliment de mostres o la pré-capacitació. No obstant això, aquests estudis segueixen desconeguts en capturar passatge amb conflictes de representació interna de granularitat de modelació incorrecta. Concretament, sota la nostra observació que un passatge pot ser organitzat per múltiples frases semànticament diferents, modelant un passatge com un vector dens unificat no és optim. Aquesta obra presenta un model refinat basat en una granularitat més petita, frases contextuals, per aliviar els conflictes afectats. En detall, introduïm una estratègia de recolliment de mostres negatiu en el passatge per animar una generació diversa de representacions de frases en el mateix passatge. Els experiments en tres conjunts de dades de referència verificen l'eficacia del nostre mètode, especialment en conjunts de dades on els conflictes són graves. Els extensos experiments presenten una bona transferibilitat del nostre mètode a través de conjunts de dades.", 'bs': 'Predstavljanja gustih prolaza u obuci putem kontrastivnog učenja pokazala je učinkovita za otvoreno domenu prikupljanje prolaza (ODPR). Postoje ispitivanja fokusiraju se na daljnje optimizaciju poboljšavajući negativnu strategiju uzorka ili dodatnu pretkišenje. Međutim, ove ispitivanja nastavljaju nepoznati u uhvaćenju prolaza sa sukobe unutarnjeg zastupanja od nepravilne granularnosti modela. Posebno, pod našim promatranjem da prolaz može biti organiziran višesemantički različitim rečenicama, modeliranje takvih prolaza kao ujedinjeni gusti vektor nije optimalno. Ovaj rad tako predstavlja rafinirani model na osnovu manje granularnosti, kontekstualne rečenice, kako bi se smanjila odgovarajući sukobi. Detaljno, predstavljamo negativnu strategiju uzorka u prolazu kako bi poticali različite generacije predstavljanja kazne u istom prolazu. Eksperimenti na tri seta podataka o referenciji potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg metoda, posebno na setima podataka gdje su konflikti teški. Prošireni eksperimenti dalje predstavljaju dobru prijenosnost naše metode preko seta podataka.', 'cs': 'Trénink reprezentace hustých pasáží prostřednictvím kontrastního učení byl prokázán účinný pro Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Stávající studie se zaměřují na další optimalizaci zlepšením strategie negativního vzorkování nebo extra předškolení. Tyto studie však zůstávají neznámé při zachycení průchodu s vnitřními reprezentačními konflikty z nesprávné modelování granularity. Konkrétně, pod naším pozorováním, že pasáž může být uspořádána více sémanticky odlišnými větami, modelování takové pasáže jako sjednoceného hustého vektoru není optimální. Tato práce tak prezentuje rafinovaný model na základě menší granularity, kontextových vět, aby zmírnil dotčené konflikty. Podrobně představujeme strategii negativního vzorkování v pasáži, která podpoří různorodou generaci reprezentací vět v rámci stejné pasáže. Experimenty na třech referenčních datových sadách ověřují účinnost naší metody, zejména na datových sadách, kde jsou konflikty závažné. Rozsáhlé experimenty dále představují dobrou přenositelnost naší metody napříč datovými sadami.', 'et': 'Tihedate läbipääsude representatsioonide koolitamine kontrastiivse õppe kaudu on näidanud tõhusat Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR). Olemasolevad uuringud keskenduvad edasisele optimeerimisele negatiivse proovivõtu strateegia parandamise või täiendava eelkoolituse abil. Need uuringud jäävad siiski teadmata, kuidas jäädvustada läbipääsu sisemise esindamise konfliktidega ebaõigest modelleerimise granulaarsusest. Täpsemalt, meie tähelepanu all, et läbipääsu saab korraldada mitme semantiliselt erineva lausega, ei ole sellise läbipääsu modelleerimine ühtse tiheda vektorina optimaalne. Käesolevas töös esitatakse seega rafineeritud mudel, mis põhineb väiksemal granulaarsusel, kontekstilistel lausetel, et leevendada asjaomaseid konflikte. Üksikasjalikult tutvustame läbipääsu negatiivse valimi strateegiat, et julgustada erinevaid lauseesitusi samas lõigus. Kolme võrdlusandmekogumiga tehtud katsed kinnitavad meie meetodi tõhusust, eriti andmekogumites, kus konfliktid on tõsised. Laiaulatuslikud katsed näitavad meie meetodi hea ülekantavuse andmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Tiivistettyjen kulkuesitysten harjoittelu kontrastiivisen oppimisen avulla on osoittautunut tehokkaaksi Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR) -menetelmässä. Olemassa olevissa tutkimuksissa keskitytään optimointiin parantamalla negatiivista näytteenottostrategiaa tai ylimääräistä esikoulutusta. Nämä tutkimukset eivät kuitenkaan ole tiedossa sisäisten esitysristiriitojen kuvaamisessa epäasianmukaisesta mallinnuksen granulaarisuudesta. Tarkemmin sanottuna havaintomme mukaan kulku voidaan järjestää useilla semanttisesti erilaisilla lauseilla, tällaisen kulkun mallintaminen yhtenäisenä tiheänä vektorina ei ole optimaalista. Tässä työssä esitetään näin ollen hiottu malli, joka perustuu pienempiin yksityiskohtiin, kontekstuaalisiin lauseisiin, jotta konfliktit voidaan lievittää. Yksityiskohtaisesti esittelemme siirtymävaiheen negatiivisen näytteenottostrategian kannustaaksemme monimuotoista lauseiden esittämistä samassa kohdassa. Kolmella vertailuaineistolla tehdyt kokeet vahvistavat menetelmämme tehokkuuden erityisesti niissä aineistoissa, joissa konfliktit ovat vakavia. Laajat kokeet osoittavat myös, että menetelmämme on hyvä siirtää aineistojen välillä.', 'jv': 'Learn Learn Mode politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop Ngomongke iki dadi nambah model sing gawe ngupakan ning keadaan kelas granularané, sawar kontinus, nggawe barang nggawe gerakan. y section section', 'ha': "An nuna masu amfani da shiryuwar shirin bayani na fitarwa mai cikakken shirin ayuka (ODR). Ana iya amfani da kwamfyuta masu motsi da kwamfyutan misalin-sami-misalin negative ko na ƙari-daurin. A lokacin da, waɗannan karatun za'a iya sani ba a kãma tafasar da murammi masu a cikin rubutu don ya sami taƙaitãwa mai inganci. Yana ƙayyade, a kan ƙaramarmu da za'a organize wata hanya na dabam-dabam da wasu kalmõmi biyu masu motsi, mai motsi da wata shawara kamar wata hanya na haɗi da shi bai zama mai amfani ba. Wannan aikin yana gaya wata misali da aka canza shi a kan salon da takardar ƙarami, da cire-sauri, dõmin ya sauƙa ƙara conflict masu husũma. Ko da bayyani, za mu introduce wani taskacin misãlai mai nega da za'a yi wa'amar wani jama'a dabam-daban a cikin sami guda. Experiments on data sites uku Extensive experiments further present good transferability of our method across datasets.", 'he': 'הוראה שימוש מוצגת דרכים צפופופות באמצעות לימוד נוגדי יעיל לשחזור דרכים במקום פתוח (Open-Domain Passage Retrieval, ODPR). מחקרים קיימים מתמקדים על אופטימיזציה נוספת על ידי שיפור אסטרטגיה דגימות שלילית או שיפור מחדש. בכל אופן, המחקרים האלה לא ידועים בכך שיתפסו מעבר עם סכסוכים של מייצג פנימי מתוך סכינות מודל לא נכונה. במיוחד, תחת הבחנה שלנו שמעבר יכול להיות מאורגן על ידי משפטים מרובים סמנטיים שונים, הדוגמה של עבר כזה כווקטור צפוף מאוחד אינה אופטימית. This work thus presents a refined model on the basis of a smaller granularity, contextual sentences, to alleviate the concerned conflicts.  בפרטים, אנחנו מציגים אסטרטגיה שלילית של דגימות במעבר כדי לעודד דור מגוון של מייצגי משפטים בתוך אותו המעבר. ניסויים על שלושה קבוצות נתונים רמזים מאשרים את היעילות של השיטה שלנו, במיוחד על קבוצות נתונים שבו הקונפליקטים קשים. ניסויים רחבים נוספים מציגים שיטת העברה טובה של השיטה שלנו בין קבוצות נתונים.', 'sk': 'Usposabljanje gostih predstavitev prehodov prek kontrastnega učenja se je izkazalo za učinkovito pri odprtem domenu pridobivanja prehodov (ODPR). Obstoječe študije se osredotočajo na nadaljnjo optimizacijo z izboljšanjem strategije negativnega vzorčenja ali dodatnim predusposabljanjem. Vendar pa te študije ostajajo neznane pri zajemanju prehodov z notranjimi reprezentacijskimi konflikti zaradi nepravilne granularnosti modeliranja. Natančneje, pod našim opazovanjem, da je prehod mogoče organizirati z več semantično različnimi stavki, modeliranje takega prehoda kot enotnega gostega vektorja ni optimalno. V tem delu je tako predstavljen prefinjen model na osnovi manjše natančnosti, kontekstualnih stavkov, za lajšanje zadevnih konfliktov. Podrobno predstavljamo strategijo negativnega vzorčenja v prehodu za spodbujanje različne generacije stavkov znotraj istega odlomka. Poskusi na treh referenčnih naborih podatkov preverjajo učinkovitost naše metode, zlasti na naborih podatkov, kjer so konflikti resni. Obsežni poskusi nadalje predstavljajo dobro prenosljivost naše metode med nabori podatkov.', 'bo': 'གཞུང་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐང་ཚད་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཐང་ཆེ་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་སྟངས་སྟོན་ཡོད།Open-Domain Passage Retrieval (ODPR) Existing studies focused on further optimizing by improving negative sampling strategy or extra pretraining. ཡིན་ནའང་། ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྣང་མེད་པའི་ལས་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་ཕར་རྟགས་བཀལ་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་ཏེ། ཁྱད་དོན་དག་བརྟན་པར། ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་རྒྱུད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མ་འདྲ་བ་ལས་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། འདིས་ལས་གནད་དོན་དག་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཞིག་མ་ཟད་པ་ཅིག་གི་མཐོ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ལས་དུས་འཚོལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ནས་ཚིག་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་མི་རྣམས་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་སྐ Label རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་པས་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྐུལ་བརྗོད་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་ཡིན་པས།'}
{'en': '', 'ar': '{RR}: الاستدلال الاستنتاجي الصادق والقوي على اللغة الطبيعية', 'es': 'Fai {RR}: Razonamiento deductivo fiel y sólido sobre el lenguaje natural', 'pt': 'Fai{RR}: Raciocínio dedutivo fiel e robusto sobre a linguagem natural', 'fr': 'Fai {RR}\xa0: Raisonnement déductif fidèle et robuste sur le langage naturel', 'ja': 'フェイ{RR }：自然言語よりも忠実で堅牢な推論', 'zh': 'Fai{RR}曰:自然语言上忠而健演绎推理', 'hi': 'Fai{RR}: प्राकृतिक भाषा पर वफादार और मजबूत निगमनात्मक तर्क', 'ru': 'Fai{RR}: Верное и сильное дедуктивное мышление над естественным языком', 'ga': 'Fai{RR}: Réasúnaíocht Dhídeallach Láidir ar Theanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'Fai', 'kk': 'Fai', 'hu': 'Fai{RR}: Hűséges és robusztus deduktív érvelés a természetes nyelv felett', 'el': 'Πίστη και Ισχυρή Αποκαλτική Λογιστική πάνω από τη Φυσική Γλώσσα', 'mk': 'Fai{RR}: Верно и силно дедуктивно размислување за природниот јазик', 'it': 'Fai{RR}: Ragionamento deduttivo fedele e robusto sul linguaggio naturale', 'ml': 'Fai{RR}: Faithful and Robust Deductive Reasoning over Natural Language', 'mt': 'Fai{RR}', 'mn': 'Fai{RR}: Найгалийн хэл дээр итгэлтэй болон хүчтэй ойлголтын шалтгаан', 'lt': 'Fai{RR}', 'ms': 'Fai{RR}', 'no': 'Fai{RR}: Gyldige og robust deductive grunn over naturspråk', 'pl': 'Fai{RR}: Wierne i solidne rozumowanie dedukcyjne nad językiem naturalnym', 'ro': 'Fail{RR}: Raționare deductivă credincioasă și robustă asupra limbajului natural', 'sv': 'Fai{RR}: Trofast och robust deduktiv resonemang över naturligt språk', 'si': 'Fai{RR}: විශ්වාසිය හා සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා', 'so': 'Fail {RR}: Fail and Robust Deductive Reading over Natural Language', 'sr': 'Fai{RR}: Verna i snažna deduktivna razlika nad prirodnim jezikom', 'ta': 'Fai{RR}: Faithful and Robust Deductive Reasoning over Natural Language', 'ur': 'Fai{RR}: Faith and robust Deductive Reasoning over Natural Language', 'uz': '{RR}: Tafsilotlar tilida haqiqiqiy va ishlatish muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi', 'vi': 'Sự hợp tác và bền bỉ về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'nl': 'Fai{RR}: getrouw en robuust afleidend redeneren boven natuurlijke taal', 'bg': 'Верен и здрав дедуктивен разум над естествения език', 'da': 'Fai{RR}: Trofast og Robust Deduktiv Ræsonnering over Naturligt Sprog', 'hr': 'Fai{RR}: Vjerljiv i snažan deduktivni razlog nad prirodnim jezikom', 'de': 'Fai{RR}: Treue und robuste deduktive Vernunft über natürliche Sprache', 'id': 'Fai{RR}', 'ko': 'Fai{R}: 자연 언어에 대한 충실하고 강력한 연역 추리', 'fa': 'Fai{RR}: Reasoning Faithful and robust Decductive Reasoning over Natural Language', 'sw': 'Failure {RR}: Msomaji wa lugha ya asili', 'af': 'Fai{RR}: Geloofde en sterkte verwysing oor Natuurlike Taal', 'tr': 'Fai{RR}: Gynançly we çykyş Tebiýet Dilinde ynamly sebäpler', 'sq': 'Fai{RR}', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Ֆայ{Ռ}: Հավատարիմ և ուժեղ կրթական պատճառ բնական լեզուների վերաբերյալ', 'az': 'Fai', 'bn': '{RR}: প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার উপর বিশ্বাস এবং রোবাস্ট ডিডুবাস্ট প্রতিক্রিয়া', 'bs': 'Fai{RR}: Vjernik i snažan deduktivni razlog za prirodni jezik', 'ca': 'Fai{RR}: Una raó deductiva fidel i robusta sobre el llenguatge natural', 'cs': 'Fai{RR}: Věrné a robustní deduktivní rozumování nad přirozeným jazykem', 'et': 'Fai{RR}: Ustav ja tugev deduktiivne mõtlemine loodusliku keele üle', 'fi': 'Fai{RR}: Uskollinen ja vankka deduktiivinen järkeily luonnollisen kielen sijaan', 'jv': 'Failed {RR}', 'sk': 'Fai{RR}: Zvesto in robustno deduktivno razumevanje nad naravnim jezikom', 'ha': 'Fai{RR}: Faithful and Robust Deductive Reasoning over Natural Language', 'he': 'Fai{RR}: הגיון משפחתי אמין וחזק על שפה טבעית', 'bo': 'Fai{RR}: Faithful and Robust Deductive Reasoning over Natural Language'}
{'en': 'Current Open-Domain Question Answering (ODQA) models typically include a retrieving module and a reading module, where the retriever selects potentially relevant passages from open-source documents for a given question, and the reader produces an answer based on the retrieved passages. The recently proposed Fusion-in-Decoder (FiD) framework is a representative example, which is built on top of a dense passage retriever and a generative reader, achieving the state-of-the-art performance. In this paper we further improve the FiD approach by introducing a knowledge-enhanced version, namely KG-FiD. Our new model uses a knowledge graph to establish the structural relationship among the retrieved passages, and a graph neural network (GNN) to re-rank the passages and select only a top few for further processing. Our experiments on common ODQA benchmark datasets (Natural Questions and TriviaQA) demonstrate that KG-FiD can achieve comparable or better performance in answer prediction than FiD, with less than 40% of the computation cost.', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن المحولات قادرة على أداء التفكير الاستنتاجي على قاعدة قواعد منطقية تحتوي على قواعد وبيانات مكتوبة بلغة طبيعية. تُظهر الأعمال الحديثة أن مثل هذه النماذج يمكن أن تنتج أيضًا خطوات التفكير (أي الرسم البياني الإثبات) التي تحاكي عملية التفكير المنطقي للنموذج. حاليًا ، تُنشئ نماذج الصندوق الأسود هذه كلاً من الرسم البياني الإثبات والاستدلالات الوسيطة في نفس النموذج ، وبالتالي قد تكون غير مخلصين. في هذا العمل ، نضع إطارًا لمهمة التفكير المنطقي الاستنتاجي من خلال تحديد ثلاثة مكونات معيارية: اختيار القاعدة ، واختيار الحقيقة ، وتكوين المعرفة. تحدد خطوات اختيار القاعدة والحقيقة قاعدة المرشح والحقائق المراد استخدامها ، ثم يجمعها تكوين المعرفة لإنشاء استنتاجات جديدة. هذا يضمن إخلاص النموذج من خلال العلاقة السببية المؤكدة من خطوة الإثبات إلى الاستدلال المنطقي. لاختبار إطار العمل الخاص بنا ، نقترح FaiRR (المنطق المخلص والقوي) حيث يتم تصميم المكونات الثلاثة المذكورة أعلاه بشكل مستقل بواسطة المحولات. نلاحظ أن FaiRR قوي في مواجهة الاضطرابات اللغوية الجديدة ، وهو أسرع في الاستدلال من الأعمال السابقة على مجموعات البيانات المنطقية الحالية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، على عكس النماذج التوليدية للصندوق الأسود ، فإن الأخطاء التي ارتكبها FaiRR أكثر قابلية للتفسير بسبب النهج المعياري.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que les transformateurs sont capables d'effectuer un raisonnement déductif sur une base de règles logique contenant des règles et des instructions écrites en langage naturel. Des travaux récents montrent que de tels modèles peuvent également produire les étapes de raisonnement (c'est-à-dire le graphe de preuve) qui imitent le processus de raisonnement logique du modèle. Actuellement, ces modèles de boîte noire génèrent à la fois le graphe de preuve et les inférences intermédiaires au sein du même modèle et peuvent donc être infidèles. Dans ce travail, nous définissons la tâche de raisonnement logique déductif en définissant trois composantes modulaires\xa0: la sélection des règles, la sélection des faits et la composition des connaissances. Les étapes de sélection des règles et des faits sélectionnent la règle candidate et les faits à utiliser, puis la composition des connaissances les combine pour générer de nouvelles inférences. Cela garantit la fidélité du modèle grâce à une relation causale assurée depuis l'étape de la preuve jusqu'au raisonnement d'inférence. Pour tester notre framework, nous proposons FairR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner) où les trois composants ci-dessus sont modélisés indépendamment par des transformateurs. Nous observons que FairR est robuste face aux nouvelles perturbations du langage et qu'il est plus rapide en termes d'inférence que les travaux précédents sur des ensembles de données de raisonnement existants. De plus, contrairement aux modèles génératifs en boîte noire, les erreurs commises par FairR sont plus interprétables en raison de l'approche modulaire.", 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que los transformadores pueden realizar razonamiento deductivo sobre una base de reglas lógica que contiene reglas y declaraciones escritas en lenguaje natural. Trabajos recientes muestran que estos modelos también pueden producir los pasos de razonamiento (es decir, el gráfico de prueba) que emulan el proceso de razonamiento lógico del modelo. Actualmente, estos modelos de caja negra generan tanto el gráfico de prueba como las inferencias intermedias dentro del mismo modelo y, por lo tanto, pueden ser infieles. En este trabajo, enmarcamos la tarea de razonamiento lógico deductivo definiendo tres componentes modulares: selección de reglas, selección de hechos y composición de conocimientos. Los pasos de selección de reglas y hechos seleccionan la regla candidata y los hechos que se utilizarán y, a continuación, la composición del conocimiento los combina para generar nuevas inferencias. Esto asegura la fidelidad del modelo mediante una relación causal asegurada desde la etapa de prueba hasta el razonamiento de la inferencia. Para probar nuestro marco, proponemos FairR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner) donde los tres componentes anteriores son modelados de forma independiente por transformadores. Observamos que FairR es resistente a las perturbaciones novedosas del lenguaje y es más rápido en la inferencia que los trabajos anteriores en los conjuntos de datos de razonamiento existentes. Además, a diferencia de los modelos generativos de caja negra, los errores cometidos por FairR son más interpretables debido al enfoque modular.', 'pt': 'Os transformadores demonstraram ser capazes de realizar raciocínio dedutivo em uma base de regra lógica contendo regras e declarações escritas em linguagem natural. Trabalhos recentes mostram que tais modelos também podem produzir as etapas de raciocínio (ou seja, o gráfico de prova) que emulam o processo de raciocínio lógico do modelo. Atualmente, esses modelos de caixa preta geram tanto o gráfico de prova quanto as inferências intermediárias dentro do mesmo modelo e, portanto, podem ser infiéis. Neste trabalho, enquadramos a tarefa de raciocínio lógico dedutivo definindo três componentes modulares: seleção de regras, seleção de fatos e composição de conhecimento. As etapas de seleção de regras e fatos selecionam a regra candidata e os fatos a serem usados e, em seguida, a composição do conhecimento os combina para gerar novas inferências. Isso garante a fidelidade do modelo pela relação causal assegurada desde a etapa de prova até o raciocínio de inferência. Para testar nosso framework, propomos FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner) onde os três componentes acima são modelados independentemente por transformadores. Observamos que FaiRR é robusto a novas perturbações de linguagem e é mais rápido na inferência do que trabalhos anteriores em conjuntos de dados de raciocínio existentes. Além disso, em contraste com os modelos generativos de caixa preta, os erros cometidos pelo FaiRR são mais interpretáveis devido à abordagem modular.', 'ja': 'トランスフォーマーは、自然言語で記述されたルールおよびステートメントを含む論理的ルールベースで推論を実行することができることが示されている。 最近の研究は、そのようなモデルが、モデルの論理的推論プロセスをエミュレートする推論ステップ（すなわち、証明グラフ）を生成することもできることを示している。 現在、これらのブラックボックスモデルは、同じモデル内でプルーフグラフと中間推論の両方を生成し、したがって、不誠実であり得る。 この研究では、ルール選択、事実選択、および知識構成の3つのモジュール構成要素を定義することによって、演繹的論理推論タスクをフレームワークします。 ルールと事実の選択ステップは、使用する候補ルールと事実を選択し、知識構成がそれらを組み合わせて新しい推論を生成します。 このモデルは、証明ステップから推論までの因果関係によって保証される忠実性を保証する。 フレームワークをテストするために、上記の3つのコンポーネントが変圧器によって独立してモデル化されるFaiRR （ Faithful and Robust Reasoner ）を提案します。 我々は、FaiRRが新規言語の摂動に対して堅牢であり、既存の推論データセットに関する以前の研究よりも推論が速いことを観察する。 さらに、ブラックボックス生成モデルとは対照的に、FaiRRによる誤差は、モジュラーアプローチにより解釈可能である。', 'zh': '变形金刚已证能包自然语言编次及语句逻辑库上行演绎推理。 近者究之,可以生模拟模型逻辑推理推理步骤(即图)。 今此黑盒同形而生证图中推理,疑其不忠也。 于是定义三模块化组件以构演绎逻辑推理务:则选择,事简知合。 则与事实选步骤选用之法与事实,然后知识合之以成新推。 此自步骤至于推理推理者,有保因果关系以保模可靠性也。 试我框架,发FaiRR(忠实,鲁棒推理器),三组件独立变压器建模。 观FaiRR之动新言也壮矣,且疾于前集上。 此外与黑盒生模,FaiRR所犯由模块化术而更具可解释性。', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर को प्राकृतिक भाषा में लिखे गए नियमों और बयानों वाले तार्किक नियम आधार पर निगमनात्मक तर्क करने में सक्षम दिखाया गया है। हाल के कार्यों से पता चलता है कि इस तरह के मॉडल भी तर्क चरणों (यानी, सबूत ग्राफ) का उत्पादन कर सकते हैं जो मॉडल की तार्किक तर्क प्रक्रिया का अनुकरण करते हैं। वर्तमान में, ये ब्लैक-बॉक्स मॉडल एक ही मॉडल के भीतर सबूत ग्राफ और मध्यवर्ती अनुमान दोनों उत्पन्न करते हैं और इस प्रकार विश्वासघाती हो सकते हैं। इस काम में, हम तीन मॉड्यूलर घटकों को परिभाषित करके निगमनात्मक तार्किक तर्क कार्य को फ्रेम करते हैं: नियम चयन, तथ्य चयन और ज्ञान संरचना। नियम और तथ्य चयन चरण उम्मीदवार नियम और उपयोग किए जाने वाले तथ्यों का चयन करते हैं और फिर ज्ञान संरचना उन्हें नए अनुमान उत्पन्न करने के लिए जोड़ती है। यह सबूत कदम से अनुमान तर्क के लिए सुनिश्चित कारण संबंध द्वारा मॉडल वफादारी सुनिश्चित करता है। हमारे ढांचे का परीक्षण करने के लिए, हम FaiRR (वफादार और मजबूत Reasoner) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जहां उपरोक्त तीन घटक स्वतंत्र रूप से ट्रांसफॉर्मर द्वारा मॉडलिंग किए जाते हैं। हम देखते हैं कि FaiRR उपन्यास भाषा की गड़बड़ी के लिए मजबूत है, और मौजूदा तर्क डेटासेट पर पिछले कार्यों की तुलना में अनुमान पर तेज है। इसके अतिरिक्त, ब्लैक-बॉक्स जनन मॉडल के विपरीत, FaiRR द्वारा की गई त्रुटियां मॉड्यूलर दृष्टिकोण के कारण अधिक व्याख्यायोग्य हैं।', 'ru': 'Было показано, что трансформаторы способны выполнять дедуктивное мышление на логической базе правил, содержащей правила и утверждения, написанные на естественном языке. Недавние работы показывают, что такие модели могут также производить этапы рассуждений (т.е. график доказательств), которые имитируют процесс логического рассуждения модели. В настоящее время эти модели "черного ящика" генерируют как доказательный граф, так и промежуточные выводы в рамках одной и той же модели и, таким образом, могут быть неверными. В этой работе мы формулируем задачу дедуктивного логического мышления, определяя три модульных компонента: выбор правил, выбор фактов и состав знаний. Этапы выбора правила и факта выбирают правило-кандидат и факты, которые будут использоваться, а затем состав знаний объединяет их, чтобы генерировать новые выводы. Это обеспечивает точность модели, гарантируя причинно-следственную связь между этапом доказывания и выводом. Чтобы проверить нашу структуру, мы предлагаем FaiRR (верный и надежный резонатор), где вышеперечисленные три компонента независимо моделируются трансформаторами. Мы наблюдаем, что FaiRR устойчив к новым языковым возмущениям и быстрее делает выводы, чем предыдущие работы по существующим наборам данных для рассуждений. Кроме того, в отличие от генеративных моделей "черного ящика", ошибки, сделанные FaiRR, являются более интерпретируемыми благодаря модульному подходу.', 'ga': "Tá sé léirithe go bhfuil claochladáin in ann réasúnú asbhainteach a dhéanamh ar bhonn rialacha loighciúil ina bhfuil rialacha agus ráitis scríofa i dteanga nádúrtha. Léiríonn saothair le déanaí gur féidir le samhlacha den sórt sin na céimeanna réasúnaíochta a tháirgeadh freisin (i.e., an graf cruthúnais) a dhéanann aithris ar phróiseas réasúnaíochta loighciúil an mhúnla. Faoi láthair, gineann na samhlacha bosca dubh seo an graf cruthúnais agus tátail idirmheánacha laistigh den tsamhail chéanna agus mar sin d'fhéadfadh siad a bheith mídhlisteanach. Sa saothar seo, déanaimid frámaíocht ar an tasc réasúnaíochta loighciúil asbhainteach trí thrí chomhpháirt mhodúlacha a shainiú: roghnú rialacha, roghnú fíricí, agus comhdhéanamh eolais. Roghnaíonn na céimeanna roghnaithe rialacha agus fíricí riail an iarrthóra agus na fíricí a bheidh le húsáid agus ansin cuireann comhdhéanamh an eolais le chéile iad chun tátail nua a chruthú. Cinntíonn sé seo dílseacht an mhúnla trí ghaolmhaireacht chúise dearbhaithe ón gcéim cruthúnais go dtí an réasúnaíocht tátail. Chun ár gcreat a thástáil, molaimid FaiRR (Réasúnóir Dílis agus Láidir) áit a bhfuil na trí chomhpháirt thuas múnlaithe go neamhspleách ag claochladáin. Tugaimid faoi deara go bhfuil FairRR láidir in aghaidh suaitheadh teanga nua, agus go bhfuil sé níos tapúla ó thaobh tátal a bhaint as ná saothair roimhe seo ar thacair sonraí réasúnaíochta atá ann cheana féin. Ina theannta sin, i gcodarsnacht le samhlacha giniúna dubh-bhosca, is féidir na hearráidí a dhéanann FaiRR a léirmhíniú níos fearr mar gheall ar an gcur chuige modúlach.", 'el': 'Οι μετασχηματιστές έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι είναι σε θέση να εκτελέσουν συμπεραστική συλλογιστική σε μια λογική βάση κανόνων που περιέχει κανόνες και δηλώσεις γραμμένες σε φυσική γλώσσα. Πρόσφατες εργασίες δείχνουν ότι τέτοια μοντέλα μπορούν επίσης να παράγουν τα βήματα συλλογισμού (δηλ. το γράφημα απόδειξης) που μιμούνται τη διαδικασία λογικής συλλογισμού του μοντέλου. Επί του παρόντος, αυτά τα μοντέλα μαύρου κουτιού παράγουν τόσο το γράφημα απόδειξης όσο και ενδιάμεσα συμπεράσματα μέσα στο ίδιο μοντέλο και έτσι μπορεί να είναι άπιστο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, πλαισιώνουμε την εργασία της επαγωγικής λογικής συλλογισμού ορίζοντας τρία αρθρωτά συστατικά: επιλογή κανόνα, επιλογή γεγονότων και σύνθεση γνώσης. Τα βήματα επιλογής κανόνα και γεγονότων επιλέγουν τον υποψήφιο κανόνα και τα γεγονότα που θα χρησιμοποιηθούν και στη συνέχεια η σύνθεση της γνώσης τα συνδυάζει για να δημιουργήσει νέα συμπεράσματα. Αυτό διασφαλίζει την πιστότητα του μοντέλου μέσω της εξασφαλισμένης αιτιώδους σχέσης από το στάδιο της απόδειξης έως τη συλλογιστική συμπερασμάτων. Για να δοκιμάσουμε το πλαίσιο μας, προτείνουμε το όπου τα παραπάνω τρία συστατικά μοντελοποιούνται ανεξάρτητα από μετασχηματιστές. Παρατηρούμε ότι το FaiRR είναι ανθεκτικό σε νέες γλωσσικές διαταραχές και είναι ταχύτερο στο συμπέρασμα από προηγούμενες εργασίες σε υπάρχοντα σύνολα δεδομένων συλλογισμού. Επιπλέον, σε αντίθεση με τα παράγωγα μοντέλα μαύρων κουτιών, τα λάθη που έγιναν από το FaiRR είναι πιο ερμηνευτικά λόγω της μορφωματικής προσέγγισης.', 'ka': 'ტრანფორმენტები ჩვენებულია, რომ შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ განსხვავებული პარამენტები ლოგიური წესების ბაზში, რომლებიც წესები და განსხვავებები, რომლებიც ნახვადასხვ ახლა მხოლოდ მუშაობები აჩვენებენ, რომ ასეთი მოდელები შეუძლია ასევე გავამუშაოთ პარამენტის ნაწილები (მაგალითად წარმოდგენის გრაფიკა), რომელიც მოდელის ლოგიკურ მიმდინარე, ეს შავი კოსტის მოდელები იგივე მოდელში იქნება წარმოდგენებული გრაფიკაში და სხვა მოდელში განსხვავებული ინფრენციები და ამიტომ შეიძლება იქნება არასწორი. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ განვაკეთებთ სამი მოდოლური კომპონენტების განსაზღვრებით განვაკეთებული ლოგიკური პარამენტის დავაკეთებთ: წესების მონიშნე, ფაქტის მონიშ წესები და ფაქტის მონიშნულება მონიშნეთ კანდიდენტის წესები და ფაქტი, რომლებიც გამოიყენება და შემდეგ ცნობიერების კომპოზიცია ისინი კომპოზიცია შე ეს მოდელური სიმართლეულობას დაახლობს დარწმუნებული წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობით წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობით. ჩვენი კომპონემენტის ტესტისთვის, ჩვენ მინდომა FaiRR (მწოდებელი და robust Reasoner) სადაც სამზე მეტი კომპონემენტი არსებობით ტრანფორმენტების მოდელია. ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ FaiRR არის ძალიან პროტუბურაციების პერტუბურაციისთვის, და უფრო სიჩქარე ინფრენციაში, ვიდრე წინაღალდე სამუშაო მონაცემების სამუ დამატებით, შავი კონტაქტის გენერაციური მოდელების კონტრასტში, FaiRR-ის შეცდომები უფრო მსგავსია მოდელური პროგრამიდან.', 'it': "I trasformatori hanno dimostrato di essere in grado di eseguire ragionamenti deduttivi su una base di regole logiche contenente regole e affermazioni scritte in linguaggio naturale. Lavori recenti dimostrano che tali modelli possono anche produrre le fasi di ragionamento (cioè, il grafico di prova) che emulano il processo di ragionamento logico del modello. Attualmente, questi modelli black-box generano sia il grafico di prova che le inferenze intermedie all'interno dello stesso modello e quindi possono essere infedeli. In questo lavoro, inquadramo il compito di ragionamento logico deduttivo definendo tre componenti modulari: selezione delle regole, selezione dei fatti e composizione della conoscenza. Le fasi di selezione delle regole e dei fatti selezionano la regola del candidato e i fatti da utilizzare e quindi la composizione della conoscenza li combina per generare nuove inferenze. Ciò garantisce la fedeltà del modello mediante una relazione causale assicurata dalla fase di prova al ragionamento dell'inferenza. Per testare il nostro framework, proponiamo FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner) dove i tre componenti di cui sopra sono modellati indipendentemente da trasformatori. Osserviamo che FaiRR è robusto alle nuove perturbazioni linguistiche ed è più veloce ad inferenza rispetto ai lavori precedenti su insiemi di dati di ragionamento esistenti. Inoltre, a differenza dei modelli generativi black-box, gli errori commessi da FaiRR sono più interpretabili grazie all'approccio modulare.", 'kk': 'Трансформациялары тәуелсіздік тілде жазылған ережелер мен мәліметтерді логикалық ережелер панелінде түсіндіруге болады. Жуырдағы жұмыстар бұл үлгілердің логикалық түсініктеме процесін эмуляциялау үлгілерді (т.е. тексеру графика) жасауға болады дегенді көрсетеді. Бұл қара жазу үлгілері тексеру графикасын және бір моделінің ішінде орташасын құрады және бұл үлгілері дұрыс емес болуы мүмкін. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз үш модульді компоненттерді анықтап тұратын логикалық түзету тапсырмасын құрамыз: ережелерді таңдау, шындығын таңдау және білім құрылғысын. Ереже мен шындық таңдау қадамдары қолданылатын кандидаттар ережесін және шындықтарын таңдап, мәліметтің құрылымы жаңа кездерді құру үшін біріктіреді. Бұл тексеру қадамынан басқа тәуелсіздік деңгейіне тәуелсіздік үлгісін қамтамасыз етеді. Біздің қоршауымызды тексеру үшін FaiRR (сенімді және robust себептері) дегенді таңдаймыз. Үш компоненттердің орындағы үш компоненттерді түрлендірушілер тәуелсіздік үшін модельді Біз FaiRR романдық тілдердің ауруларына күшті деп белгіледік. Бұл барлық сезім деректер қорларында алдыңғы жұмыстардан артық жұмыстардан артық. Сонымен қара жазу үлгілеріне қарсы болса, FaiRR қателері модульдердің қасиеттері үшін толтырылмайды.', 'hu': 'A transzformátorok képesek deduktív érvelést végezni egy természetes nyelvű szabályokat és állításokat tartalmazó logikai szabálybázison. A legutóbbi munkák azt mutatják, hogy az ilyen modellek képesek előállítani a modell logikai érvelési folyamatát emuláló érvelési lépéseket (azaz a korrekciós grafikon). Jelenleg ezek a fekete dobozos modellek ugyanazon modelleken belül generálják a korrekciós grafikonokat és a közbenső következtetéseket, így hűtlenek lehetnek. Ebben a munkában a deduktív logikai érvelési feladatot három moduláris összetevő meghatározásával keretezzük meg: szabályok kiválasztása, tények kiválasztása és tudás összetétele. A szabály- és tényválasztási lépések kiválasztják a jelölt szabályt és a használandó tényeket, majd a tudásszerkezet egyesíti őket új következtetések létrehozásához. Ez biztosítja a modell hűségét a bizonyítási lépéstől a következtetési érvelésig biztosított okozati összefüggés révén. Keretrendszerünk teszteléséhez a FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reaser) javaslatot javasoljuk, ahol a fenti három komponenst transzformátorok önállóan modellezik. Megfigyeljük, hogy a FaiRR erőteljes az új nyelvzavarokkal szemben, és gyorsabban következtet, mint a meglévő érvelési adatok korábbi munkái. Ezenkívül a fekete dobozos generációs modellekkel ellentétben a FaiRR által elkövetett hibák a moduláris megközelítésnek köszönhetően értelmezhetőbbek.', 'ms': 'Penukar telah dipaparkan untuk dapat melakukan alasan deduktif pada pangkalan peraturan logik yang mengandungi peraturan dan pernyataan ditulis dalam bahasa alami. Kerja-kerja baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa model tersebut juga boleh menghasilkan langkah alasan (iaitu graf bukti) yang menggambarkan proses alasan logik model. Pada masa ini, model kotak hitam ini menghasilkan graf bukti dan kesimpulan sementara dalam model yang sama dan mungkin tidak percaya. Dalam kerja ini, kita bingkai tugas alasan logik deduktif dengan menentukan tiga komponen modular: pemilihan peraturan, pemilihan fakta, dan komposisi pengetahuan. Peraturan dan langkah pemilihan fakta memilih peraturan calon dan fakta yang akan digunakan dan kemudian komposisi pengetahuan menggabungkannya untuk menghasilkan kesimpulan baru. Ini memastikan kesetiaan model dengan hubungan penyebab yang pasti dari langkah bukti ke alasan kesimpulan. Untuk menguji kerangka kami, kami cadangkan FaiRR (Reasoner Percaya dan Kekuatan) di mana tiga komponen di atas dipodelkan secara independen oleh pengubah. We observe that FaiRR is robust to novel language perturbations, and is faster at inference than previous works on existing reasoning datasets.  Additionally, in contrast to black-box generative models, the errors made by FaiRR are more interpretable due to the modular approach.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d എഴുതിയ നിയമങ്ങളും വാക്കുകളും ഉള്ള ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d നിയമങ്ങളും നിയമങ്ങളും സംബന്ധിച്ചുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ന അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലിന്റെ ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d കാരണങ്ങളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയെ കൃത്യമാക ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ഈ കറുത്ത പെട്ടിയുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d തെളിവുകളുടെ ഗ്രാഫും തമ്മിലുള്ള രോഗങ്ങളും ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഒരേ മോഡലില്\u200d  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, മൂന്നു മോഡുള്\u200d ഘടകങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ നിയമവും സത്യത്തിന്റെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന പടികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കേണ്ട പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിതിയുടെ നിയമവും സത്യവും തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുക. പി തെളിവുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അപകടത്തിലേക്കുള്ള കാരണങ്ങളിലേക്കുള്ള കാരണ ബന്ധം ഉറപ്പുവരുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d വി നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d ഫെയെര്\u200dആര്\u200d (വിശ്വസ്തനും റോബസ്റ്റ് റിവോണ്\u200dഡര്\u200d) പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന ഫെയെര്\u200dആര്\u200d നോവല്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ കുഴപ്പങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി കൊണ്ടുപോകുന്നു എന്ന് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വേഗത്ത കൂടാതെ, കറുത്ത-പെട്ടിയുടെ ജനററിവ് മോഡലുകളോട് വിരോധമാണെങ്കില്\u200d, ഫെയിര്\u200dആര്\u200d ചെയ്ത പിശകുകള്\u200d മോഡുള്\u200d നടപടിയില്\u200d കാരണം', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл дээр бичигдсэн дүрслэл болон өгүүлбэрүүдийг логик дүрслэл дээр илтгэлцүүлж чадна гэдгийг харуулсан. Саяхан ажлын ажиллах нь ийм загварууд мөн загварын логикийн шалтгаан үйлдвэрлэх шалтгаануудыг боловсруулж чадна. Одоо энэ хар хайрцаг загварууд нь баталгаатай график болон ижил загварын дотор дундаж хайрцагдал үүсгэдэг. Иймээс итгэлтэй байж болно. Энэ ажлын тулд бид 3 модуль компонентийг тодорхойлоход логикийн урьдчилгааны задалгыг бүтээж, хууль сонголт, үнэндээ сонголт, мэдлэг бүтцийг тодорхойлдог. Хувь, үнэндээ сонголтын алхам нь хэрэглэгдэх захирамж, үнэндээ сонгож, мэдлэг бүтээгдэхүүнийг шинэ хэмжээсүүд үүсгэхийн тулд нэгтгэдэг. Энэ нь баталгааны алхмаас халдварын шалтгаанаас халдварын шалтгаанаас баталгаатай шалтгааныг итгэлтэй загварын загварыг баталж байна. Бид өөрсдийгөө шалгахын тулд "FaiRR" (Үнэндээ итгэлтэй болон Робст Солонгосор) гурван дээрх компонентүүд өөрсдийгөө өөрчлөгчид загварчлагдсан байдаг. Бид FaiRR-г шинэ хэл дээр шалтгаалдаг гэдгийг анзаарлаа. Өмнөх бодит өгөгдлийн санд байгаа ажлыг илүү хурдан халдварлах нь илүү хурдан байна. Мөн хар хайрцаг үүсгэх загваруудын эсрэг, FaiRR-ын алдаа нь модуль арга загвараас илүү ойлгох боломжтой.', 'lt': 'Buvo įrodyta, kad transformatoriai gali daryti atskaitomąjį motyvą pagal logiškas taisykles, kuriose pateikiamos taisyklės ir pareiškimai, parašyti natūralia kalba. Naujausi darbai rodo, kad tokie modeliai taip pat gali sukurti motyvavimo etapus (t. y. įrodymų grafiką), kurie imituoja modelio logišką motyvavimo procesą. Šiuo metu šie juodos dėžutės modeliai sukuria tiek įrodymų grafiką, tiek tarpines išvadas tame pačiame modelyje, todėl gali būti nepatikimi. Šiame darbe apibrėžiame išskaičiuojamąją logišką motyvavimo užduotį, apibrėžiant tris modulinius komponentus: taisyklių atranką, faktų atranką ir žinių sudėtį. Taisyklės ir faktų atrankos etapai atrenka kandidato taisyklę ir naudotinus faktus, o žinių sudėtis derina jas, kad būtų gautos naujos išvados. Tai užtikrina modelio patikimumą užtikrinant priežastinį ryšį nuo įrodymo etapo iki išvados pagrindimo. Siekiant išbandyti savo sistemą, siūlome FaiRR (patikimas ir patikimas motyvuotojas), kuriame pirmiau nurodyti trys komponentai yra atskirai modeliuojami transformatorių. Pastebėjome, kad FaiRR yra tvirtas naujų kalbų perturbacijų at žvilgiu ir yra greitesnis, palyginti su ankstesniais darbais, susijusiais su esamais pagrįstų duomenų rinkiniais. Be to, priešingai nei juodos dėžutės modeliai, FaiRR padarytos klaidos yra aiškinamos labiau dėl modulinio metodo.', 'mk': 'Transformers have been shown to be able to perform deductive reasoning on a logical rulebase containing rules and statements written in natural language.  Неодамнешните дела покажуваат дека ваквите модели, исто така, можат да ги произведат и размислувачките чекори (т.е., доказниот граф) кои емулираат логичкиот процес на размислување на моделот. Моментално, овие црни модели генерираат доказен граф и меѓувремени инференции во истиот модел и така може да бидат неверни. Во оваа работа, ја рамкуваме дедуктивната логичка задача за размислување со дефинирање на три модуларни компоненти: избор на правила, избор на факти и композиција на знаење. Правилото и чекорите на селекцијата на факти го избираат кандидатското правило и фактите кои треба да се користат и потоа композицијата на знаењето ги комбинира за да генерира нови конференции. Ова обезбедува модел на верност со сигурна причинска врска од чекорот на доказот до причината за конференција. За да ја тестираме нашата рамка, предлагаме FaiRR (Верен и Сигурен Разонер) каде што наведените три компоненти се независно моделирани од трансформаторите. Ние забележуваме дека FaiRR е силен за новите јазички пертурбирања, и е побрз од претходните дела на постоечките податоци за размислување. Покрај тоа, во разлика од моделите генерирани со црни кутии, грешките направени од FaiRR се поинтерпретабилни поради модуларниот пристап.', 'no': 'Transformerer er vist som kan utføra deduktiv grunnlag på ein logisk reglelinja som inneheld reglar og uttrykk skriven i naturspråk. Nyleg brukte arbeidar viser at slike modeller kan også produsere rasjonsgrensene (t.d. prøvingsgrafen) som emulerer modellen sin logiske rasjonsprosessen. Denne svartboksmodellen gjer både prøvingsgrafen og gjennomsnitt inferensningar i samme modell, og derfor kan vera uavhengig. I denne arbeida finn vi oppgåva for deduktiv logisk rasjon ved å definera tre modulare komponentar: regel-utval, faktiskutval og kunnskapsolusjon. Regelen og faktiske utval skal velje kandidatregelen og fakta som skal brukast, og så kjennekomponenten kombinerer dei for å laga nye inferensningar. Dette sikrer at modellen er godt ved sikker på grunnleggjande forholdet frå beviseringsteget til grunnleggjande for infeksjon. For å testa rammeverket vårt, foreslår vi FaiRR (tilfeldig og robust årsaker) der dei øvste tre komponentane er uavhengig modelert av transformerande. Vi observerer at FaiRR er sterkt til nyttige språk, og er raskare ved inferense enn tidlegare arbeidar på eksisterande datasett. I tillegg til, kontrast til svartboks genererande modeller, er feilene gjeven av FaiRR meir tolkbare på grunn av modulart tilnærming.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że transformatory są w stanie wykonywać rozumowanie dedukcyjne na logicznej bazie reguł zawierającej reguły i stwierdzenia napisane w języku naturalnym. Najnowsze prace pokazują, że takie modele mogą również produkować kroki rozumowania (tj. wykres dowodu), które emulują proces logicznego rozumowania modelu. Obecnie te modele czarnej skrzynki generują zarówno wykres dowodu, jak i wnioski pośrednie w ramach tego samego modelu i mogą być niewierne. W niniejszej pracy ramujemy zadanie dedukcyjnego rozumowania logicznego poprzez definiowanie trzech modułowych komponentów: selekcji reguł, selekcji faktów i kompozycji wiedzy. Kroki selekcji reguł i faktów wybierają regułę kandydata i fakty do wykorzystania, a następnie kompozycja wiedzy łączy je w celu generowania nowych wniosków. Zapewnia to wierność modelu poprzez pewną relację przyczynową od etapu dowodu do rozumowania wnioskowania. Aby przetestować nasz framework, proponujemy FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner), gdzie trzy powyższe elementy są niezależnie modelowane przez transformatory. Obserwujemy, że FaiRR jest solidny na nowe zaburzenia językowe i jest szybszy w wnioskowaniu niż poprzednie prace na istniejących zbiorach danych rozumowania. Dodatkowo, w przeciwieństwie do modeli generacyjnych czarnej skrzynki, błędy popełnione przez FaiRR są bardziej interpretowalne ze względu na modułowe podejście.', 'mt': 'Intwera li t-trasformaturi jistgħu jwettqu raġunament deduttiv fuq bażi ta’ regoli loġika li fiha regoli u dikjarazzjonijiet miktuba f’lingwa naturali. Ix-xogħlijiet riċenti juru li mudelli bħal dawn jistgħu jipproduċu wkoll il-passi ta’ raġunament (jiġifieri, il-grafika ta’ prova) li jimulaw il-proċe s s ta’ raġunament loġiku tal-mudell. Bħalissa, dawn il-mudelli tal-kaxxa sewda jiġġeneraw kemm il-graff ta’ prova kif ukoll l-inferenzi intermedji fl-istess mudell u għalhekk jistgħu ma jkunux kunfidenzjali. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna nqabbdu l-kompitu ta’ raġunament loġiku deduttiv billi niddefinixxu tliet komponenti modulari: l-għażla tar-regoli, l-għażla tal-fatti, u l-kompożizzjoni tal-għarfien. Ir-regoli u l-passi tal-għażla tal-fatti jagħżlu r-regola kandidata u l-fatti li għandhom jintużaw u mbagħad il-kompożizzjoni tal-għarfien tgħaqqadhom biex jiġġeneraw inferenzi ġodda. Dan jiżgura fiduċja mudell permezz ta’ relazzjoni kawżali assigurata mill-pass ta’ prova għar-raġunament ta’ inferenza. Biex jittestja l-qafas tagħna, qed nipproponu FaiRR (Reasoner Fedali u robust) fejn it-tliet komponenti ta’ hawn fuq huma mmudellati b’mod indipendenti minn trasformaturi. Aħna ninnota li FaiRR hija robusta għal perturbazzjonijiet ġodda fil-lingwi, u hija aktar mgħaġġla fl-inferenza minn xogħlijiet preċedenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti ta’ raġunament. Barra minn hekk, b’kuntrast mal-mudelli ġenerattivi tal-kaxxa sewda, l-iżbalji magħmula minn FaiRR huma aktar interpretabbli minħabba l-approċċ modulari.', 'ro': 'S-a demonstrat că transformatorii pot efectua raționamente deductive pe o bază de reguli logice conținând reguli și afirmații scrise în limbaj natural. Lucrările recente arată că astfel de modele pot produce, de asemenea, pașii de raționament (adică graficul de probă) care emulează procesul logic de raționament al modelului. În prezent, aceste modele de cutie neagră generează atât graficul de probă, cât și inferențele intermediare în cadrul aceluiași model și, astfel, pot fi necredincioase. În această lucrare, încadram sarcina raționamentului logic deductiv prin definirea a trei componente modulare: selecția regulilor, selecția faptelor și compoziția cunoștințelor. Pașii de selectare a regulilor și a faptelor selectează regula candidatului și faptele care urmează să fie utilizate și apoi compoziția cunoștințelor le combină pentru a genera noi deducții. Acest lucru asigură fidelitatea modelului prin relația cauzală asigurată de la etapa de probă la raționamentul inferenței. Pentru a testa cadrul nostru, propunem FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reactor), unde cele trei componente de mai sus sunt modelate independent de transformatoare. Observăm că FaiRR este robust la noile perturbări ale limbajului și este mai rapid la deducție decât lucrările anterioare pe seturi de date de raționament existente. În plus, spre deosebire de modelele generative black-box, erorile făcute de FaiRR sunt mai interpretabile datorită abordării modulare.', 'so': 'Turjumayaasha waxaa looga muujiyey inay awoodaan inay sameeyaan sabab gaar ah oo ay ku jiraan sharciyada caadooyinka ah oo ku qoran qoraalka afka asalka ah. Shaqooyinka la soo dhowaaday waxay muujin karaan in tusaalooyinkaas ay sameyn karaan tallaabooyin sababta ah (tusaale ahaan sawir caddeynta) oo sameynaya sameynta sababaha rasmiga ah. Hada la joogo, qaababkan madowga ah waxay sameyn karaan sawirada iyo cudurada dhexe ee isku qaab ah, sidaas darteed waxay noqon karaan mid aamin ah. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu ku sameynaa shaqada waxyaabaha la xiriiro oo la xiriira saddex qeybood oo rasmi ah: xuquuqda doorashada, doorashada runta, iyo qeybta aqoonta. Xarunta xuquuqda iyo danbiyada doorashada ayaa doorta xukunka kandidada iyo waxyaabaha lagu isticmaali karo, kadibna waxaa la xiriira qalabka aqoonta si uu u sameeyo cuduro cusub. Tani waxay ku xaqiijinaysaa aaminnimada tusaale ahaan si loo xaqiijiyo xiriirka sababta ah ee laga soo bilaabo baaritaanka iyo sababta jirada. Si aan u imtixaano firaaqadeena, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa FaiRR (aamin iyo Robust Reader) meesha saddexda kooxa ka sarreeya ay si xor ah u sameynayaan bedbedelka. Waxaynu fiirinaynaa in FaiRR la isticmaalo qalloocyada afka hore, waana ka sii dhaqso badan tahay shaqada hore oo ku saabsan qoraalka macluumaadka sababta ah. Sidoo kale waxaa kaloo lagu turjumaa qalabka dhaqanka ee qoriga ah ee FaiRR sababtoo ah.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාවට ලියපු නීති සහ වාර්තාවක් තියෙන ලියපු ලියපු ලියපු ලියපු ලියපු ලියපු ලියපුරුද්ධි අලුත් වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ මොඩේල් වලින් හිතන්න පුළුවන් කියලා (ඉතින්, සාක්ෂි ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින්) මොඩේල්ගේ ලෝකික දැන් මේ කළු බොක්ස් මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක ඇතුලේ සාක්ෂි ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක සමාධාරණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒ වග මේ වැඩේදී, අපි මොඩියුලාර් කොටස් තුනක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා: නීති තෝරණය, ඇත්ත තෝරණය, ද නීතිය සහ ඇත්ත තෝරාගන්න පැත්තක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් නීතිය සහ ඇත්තක් තෝරාගන්න, ඊට පස්සේ දන්න සංවේශන මේක ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාස කරනවා සාක්ෂික පැත්තෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන්. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා, අපි FaiRR (විශ්වාසය සහ සාධාර්ථක හේතුවක්) ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා, උඩින් තුනක් අංකය තුනක් ස් අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා FaiRR ක්\u200dරියාත්මක භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ තියෙන්න ති තවත්, කළු බොක්ස් සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200d', 'sr': 'Pokazano je da su transformatori u mogućnosti izvršiti deduktivne razgovore o logičkoj pravilima koja sadrži pravila i izjave napisane na prirodnom jeziku. Skorašnji rad pokazuje da takvi model i mogu takođe proizvesti razumne korake (tj. dokazni grafik) koji emuliraju logički proces razumevanja modela. Trenutno, ovi crno-kutijski modeli generiraju dokazni grafik i prosječne inferencije u istom modelu, i tako mogu biti nevjerni. U ovom poslu, okrenuli smo deduktivni logički razumni zadatak definisanjem tri modularne komponenta: selekcija pravila, selekcija činjenica i komponenta znanja. Pravilo i činjenica izbora korake biraju pravilo kandidata i činjenice koje treba iskoristiti, a onda ih kompozicija znanja kombinira kako bi stvorila nove inferencije. To osigurava vernost modela uvjerenim uzrokovanim odnosima od dokaza koraka do razloga infekcije. Da bismo testirali naš okvir, predlažemo FaiRR (verni i robni razlog) gde su iznad tri komponenta nezavisno modelili transformatori. Primišljamo da je FaiRR jačan na nove jezičke perturbacije, i brže je u infekciji nego prethodni rad na postojećim razumnim setima podataka. Osim toga, u suprotnosti sa generičnim modelima crne kutije greške koje je napravio FaiRR su interpretabilnije zbog modularnog pristupa.', 'sv': 'Transformers har visat sig kunna utföra deduktiva resonemang på ett logiskt regelfält som innehåller regler och uttalanden skrivna på naturligt språk. Nya arbeten visar att sådana modeller också kan producera resonemang steg (dvs korrekturgrafen) som emulerar modellens logiska resonemang process. För närvarande genererar dessa svarta lådmodeller både korrekturgrafen och mellanliggande slutsatser inom samma modell och kan därför vara otrogna. I detta arbete ramar vi in den deduktiva logiska resonemanget genom att definiera tre modulära komponenter: regelval, faktautval och kunskapssammansättning. Steg för val av regel och fakta väljer kandidatregeln och fakta som ska användas och sedan kombinerar kunskapssammansättningen dem för att generera nya slutsatser. Detta säkerställer modelltrofasthet genom säkerställd orsakssamband från bevissteget till slutsatsresonemanget. För att testa vårt ramverk föreslår vi FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reaser) där ovanstående tre komponenter modelleras oberoende av transformatorer. Vi observerar att FaiRR är robust för nya språkstörningar, och är snabbare till slutsats än tidigare arbeten på befintliga resonemangsdata. Dessutom, till skillnad från generativa modeller med svarta lådor, är de fel som görs av FaiRR mer tolkningsbara på grund av det modulära tillvägagångssättet.', 'ta': 'மாற்றுபவர் சமீபத்தில் உள்ள வேலைகள் மாதிரியின் தொடர்புடைய காரணங்கள் செயலை உருவாக்கும் காட்சியை காட்டும் தற்போது, இந்த கருப்பெட்டியின் மாதிரிகள் தெளிவான வரைப்படம் மற்றும் ஒரே மாதிரியில் உள்ள இடையே நோய்களை உருவாக்குகிறது அதனா இந்த வேலையில், நாம் தனிப்படுத்தும் தொகுதி காரணங்கள் செய்யும் செயலை மூன்று வகையான கூறுகளை வரையறுக்கிறோம்: விதிவாக தேர விதி மற்றும் உண்மையான தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு படிகள் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட தேர்வு விதி மற்றும் பயன்படுத்தப்பட வேண்டிய உண்மைகளை த இது மாதிரி நம்பிக்கையை உறுதிப்படுத்தும் தெளிவான படியிலிருந்து காரணத்தில் இருந்து காரணத்திற்கு முன எங்கள் சட்டத்தைச் சோதிக்க, மேல் மூன்று பொருள்கள் மாற்றங்கள் மூலம் தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரியாக மாற்றப்பட்டுள்ளன. நாம் பார்க்கிறோம் ஃபேஆர் புதிய மொழி பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு ரட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று, மற்றும் முந்தைய வேலைகளை விட குறைவாக கூடுதலாக, கருப்பெட்டி உருவாக்கும் மாதிரிகளுக்கு மாறுபட்டு, FaiRR யால் செய்யப்பட்ட பிழைகள் மாறுபட்ட மாதிரியினால்', 'ur': 'تبدیل کرنے والوں کو دکھایا گیا ہے کہ ایک منطقی قوانین کے بارے میں دھوکا دینے کا اختیار کرسکتے ہیں جن میں قانون اور سٹیٹمنٹ ہیں جو طبیعی زبان میں لکھی جاتی ہیں. اچھے کام دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مدل بھی منطقی قدم (یعنی ثابت گراف) کو بھی پیدا کر سکتے ہیں جو مدل کے منطقی منطقی منطقی پرسس کو اثبات کرتا ہے۔ اب یہ سیاه باکس موڈل دونوں ثابت گراف کو پیدا کرتا ہے اور ایک موڈل کے اندر بین بین اضافہ کرتا ہے اور اس طرح بھی انکار کر سکتا ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم تین موڈولر رقموں کی تعریف کے ذریعہ سے دھوکا دینے والی منطقی منطقی کام کو ڈھیر دیتے ہیں: قانون انتخاب، حقیقت انتخاب، اور علم کی تعریف کے ذریعہ۔ قانون اور حقیقت کا انتخاب قدم کائندیٹ قانون اور حقیقت کو انتخاب کرتا ہے اور اس کے بعد علم کی پیدائش ان کو نئی آلودگی پیدا کرنے کے لئے جمع کرتا ہے. یہ مدل اعتبار کے مطابق مطمئن دلیل رابطہ کے ذریعہ مطمئن ہوتا ہے کہ مدل اعتبار کے مطابق مطمئن ہوتا ہے ہم اپنے فرمود کی آزمائش کے لئے FaiRR (صاحبِ ایمان اور صاحبِ ثابت) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جہاں ان تین قسموں سے اوپر سے زیادہ مخلوقات کرنے والے ہیں۔ ہم دیکھ رہے ہیں کہ FaiRR نئی زبان کی تبلیغ پر مضبوط ہے اور پہلے کے کاموں سے زیادہ سریع ہے جو موجود منطقی ڈیٹسٹ پر ہیں. اضافہ، سیاه باکس جنرائیٹ موڈل کے مقابلہ میں، FaiRR کے ذریعہ سے خطا بہت زیادہ تفسیر قابل ہیں موڈولر طریقے کے باعث.', 'uz': "Tarjimonlar asl tilda yozilgan qoidalar va hodisalar bilan qoidalar bilan qoidalar bilan qoidalarni ishga tushirish mumkin. Yaqinda ishlarni koʻrsatish mumkin, bu modelning logical sabablar jarayonini yaratish mumkin. Hozirda, bu qora qutis modellari bir modeldagi tashqi grammatika va orasidagi kasalliklarni yaratish mumkin va shunday qilishi mumkin. Bu vazida, biz uchta modulyat komponentlarni aniqlash orqali foydalanamiz: boshqarish, haqiqiqiy tanlash, va ta'lim komponentini aniqlash. Qoidalar va haqiqiqiy qoidalar ishlatiladigan kandida qoidani tanlash va keyin ilmiy qoidani yangi kasalliklarni yaratish uchun ularni birlashtiradi. Bu model faqatga ishonch hosil qiladi, tashqi holatdan foydalanish sabablar sabablarining sabablarini ishlatadi. Jarayonni sinash uchun biz faqat & # 160; o'zgarishlar bilan boshqaruvchilarga oʻrnatilgan FaiRR (Haqiqiqiy va Robust Reaktor) talab qilamiz. Biz AQRR haqida mavjud maʼlumot tizimlari haqida o'zgarishni ko'rib chiqqamiz. @ info", 'vi': 'Quá trình biến hình đã được cho thấy có khả năng thực hiện lập trình suy luận về một quy tắc logic chứa các quy tắc và những phát biểu được viết bằng ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Những tác phẩm gần đây cho thấy những mô hình này cũng có thể tạo ra các bước lập luận (ví dụ, đồ thị bằng chứng) theo trình lý luận logic của mô- đun. Hiện tại, những mẫu hộp đen này tạo ra cả biểu đồ bằng chứng lẫn ngụ ý trung gian trong cùng một mô hình và do đó có thể không chung thủy. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi sắp xếp một nhiệm vụ suy luận theo logic bằng cách xác định ba thành phần khác: chọn luật, chọn thực tế, và cấu tạo kiến thức. Các bước chọn luật và thực tế chọn nguyên tắc và dữ kiện cần sử dụng và sau đó cấu trúc kiến thức kết hợp chúng để tạo ra những ngụ ý mới. Điều này đảm bảo tính trung thành mô hình bằng cách chắc chắn quan hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ quả từ bước bằng chứng tới lý lẽ phán quyết. Để thử khung hình của chúng tôi, chúng tôi đề nghị FaiRRT (Lý lẽ chung và bền bỉ) nơi mà ba thành phần trên được thiết lập độc lập bằng máy biến đổi. Chúng tôi quan tâm rằng FaiR kiên quyền với bọn lợi ngôn ngữ mới, và có thể chợp nhận nhanh hơn các công việc trước nghiên cửa các vị trình đàn lý. Thêm vào đó, sự khác biệt với các mô hình tạo hộp đen, lỗi của FaiR còn dễ hiểu hơn nhờ phương pháp điều chỉnh.', 'bg': 'Доказано е, че трансформаторите могат да извършват дедуктивни разсъждения върху логическа нормативна база, съдържаща правила и твърдения, написани на естествен език. Последни работи показват, че такива модели могат да произведат и стъпките на разсъждение (т.е. доказателствената графика), които имитират процеса на логическо разсъждение на модела. Понастоящем тези модели с черна кутия генерират както доказателствената графика, така и междинните изводи в рамките на един и същ модел и по този начин могат да бъдат неверни. В тази работа ние оформяме задачата за дедуктивно логическо разсъждаване чрез дефиниране на три модулни компонента: избор на правило, избор на факти и състав на знанието. Стъпките за избор на правило и факти избират правилото на кандидата и фактите, които да бъдат използвани, а след това съставът на знанието ги комбинира, за да генерира нови изводи. Това гарантира вярност на модела чрез гарантирана причинно-следствена връзка от етапа на доказване до заключението. За да тестваме нашата рамка, предлагаме където горните три компонента се моделират самостоятелно от трансформатори. Наблюдаваме, че е здрав към нови езикови смущения и е по-бърз в заключенията от предишни работи върху съществуващи набори от данни за разсъждения. Освен това, за разлика от генеративните модели с черна кутия, грешките, направени от са по-интерпретирани поради модулния подход.', 'nl': 'Transformers hebben aangetoond dat ze deductieve redenering kunnen uitvoeren op een logische regelbasis die regels en uitspraken bevat geschreven in natuurlijke taal. Recente werken tonen aan dat dergelijke modellen ook de redeneringsstappen (d.w.z. de bewijsgrafiek) kunnen produceren die het logische redeneringsproces van het model nabootsen. Momenteel genereren deze black-box modellen zowel de proof grafiek als tussentijdse conclusies binnen hetzelfde model en kunnen dus ontrouw zijn. In dit werk kaderen we de deductieve logische redenering taak door drie modulaire componenten te definiëren: regelselectie, factselectie en kennissamenstelling. De regel- en factselectiestappen selecteren de kandidaat-regel en de te gebruiken feiten en vervolgens combineert de kennissamenstelling deze om nieuwe conclusies te genereren. Dit waarborgt modeltrouw door verzekerd causaal verband van de bewijsstap tot de conclusieredenering. Om ons framework te testen, stellen we FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner) voor waarbij de bovenstaande drie componenten onafhankelijk worden gemodelleerd door transformatoren. We constateren dat FaiRR robuust is tegen nieuwe taalstoornissen, en sneller in inferentie is dan eerdere werken op bestaande redeneringsdatasets. Bovendien zijn de fouten van FaiRR, in tegenstelling tot generatieve black-box modellen, beter interpreteerbaar door de modulaire aanpak.', 'hr': 'Pokazano je da su transformatori u mogućnosti izvršiti deduktivne razgovore o logičkoj vlasti koja sadrži pravila i izjave napisane na prirodnom jeziku. Skorašnji rad pokazuje da takvi model i mogu također proizvesti razumni koraci (tj. grafik dokaza) koji emuliraju logički razumni proces modela. Trenutno, ovi crno-kutijski modeli generiraju dokazni grafik i prosječne inferencije u istom modelu i mogu biti nevjerni. U ovom poslu, okrenuli smo deduktivni logički odgovorni zadatak definiranjem tri modularne komponenta: izbor pravila, izbor činjenica i komponenta znanja. Pravilo i činjenični koraci izbora biraju pravilo kandidata i činjenice koje će se koristiti, a zatim sastav znanja ih kombinira kako bi stvorila nove inferencije. To osigurava vjernost modela uvjerenim uzrokovanim odnosima od koraka dokaza do razuma infekcije. Da bismo testirali naš okvir, predlažemo FaiRR (vjerni i robni razlog) gdje su iznad tri komponenta nezavisno modelirani transformacijama. Primjećujemo da je FaiRR jačan za nove jezičke perturbacije i brže u infekciji od prethodnih radova na postojećim razumnim podacima. Osim toga, u suprotnosti s generičnim modelima crne kutije, greške koje je napravio FaiRR su interpretabilnije zbog modularnog pristupa.', 'da': 'Transformers har vist sig at være i stand til at udføre deduktive ræsonnementer på et logisk regelbaser, der indeholder regler og udsagn skrevet i naturligt sprog. Nyere værker viser, at sådanne modeller også kan producere ræsonneringstrin (dvs. korrekturgrafen), der efterligner modellens logiske ræsonneringsproces. I øjeblikket genererer disse sorte boksmodeller både korrekturgrafen og mellemliggende konklusioner inden for samme model og kan derfor være utro. I dette arbejde rammer vi den deduktive logiske ræsonnement opgave ved at definere tre modulære komponenter: regeludvælgelse, faktaudvalg og videnssammensætning. Trinene til udvælgelse af regler og fakta vælger kandidatreglen og fakta, der skal bruges, og derefter kombinerer videnssammensætningen dem for at skabe nye konklusioner. Dette sikrer modellens troværdighed ved sikret årsagssammenhæng fra bevisstrin til konklusionens ræsonnement. For at teste vores framework foreslår vi FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner), hvor ovennævnte tre komponenter modelleres uafhængigt af transformere. Vi bemærker, at FaiRR er robust over for nye sprogforstyrrelser, og er hurtigere til udledelse end tidligere værker på eksisterende ræsonnement datasæt. Desuden, i modsætning til black-box generative modeller, er fejlene begået af FaiRR mere fortolkelige på grund af den modulære tilgang.', 'de': 'Transformatoren haben gezeigt, dass sie deduktive Argumentation auf einer logischen Regelbasis durchführen können, die Regeln und Anweisungen enthält, die in natürlicher Sprache geschrieben wurden. Neuere Arbeiten zeigen, dass solche Modelle auch die Argumentationsschritte (d.h. den Proof Graph) erzeugen können, die den logischen Argumentationsprozess des Modells nachahmen. Derzeit generieren diese Black-Box-Modelle sowohl den Proof Graph als auch Zwischenfolgerungen innerhalb desselben Modells und können daher untreu sein. In dieser Arbeit umrahmen wir die deduktive logische Argumentationsaufgabe, indem wir drei modulare Komponenten definieren: Regelauswahl, Faktenauswahl und Wissenszusammensetzung. Die Regel- und Faktenauswahlschritte wählen die Kandidatenregel und die zu verwendenden Fakten aus und die Wissenszusammensetzung kombiniert sie zu neuen Schlussfolgerungen. Dies gewährleistet die Modelltreue durch gesicherte kausale Beziehung vom Beweisschritt bis zur Schlussfolgerung. Um unser Framework zu testen, schlagen wir FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner) vor, bei dem die oben genannten drei Komponenten unabhängig von Transformatoren modelliert werden. Wir beobachten, dass FaiRR robust gegenüber neuartigen Sprachstörungen ist und schneller in der Inferenz ist als frühere Arbeiten an bestehenden Argumentationsdatensätzen. Zusätzlich sind die Fehler von FaiRR im Gegensatz zu generativen Black-Box-Modellen durch den modularen Ansatz besser interpretierbar.', 'id': 'Transformers telah terbukti mampu melakukan alasan deduktif pada dasar aturan logis yang mengandung aturan dan pernyataan ditulis dalam bahasa alam. Pekerjaan baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa model tersebut juga dapat menghasilkan langkah reasoning (i.e., grafik bukti) yang emulasi proses reasoning logis model. Saat ini, model kotak hitam ini menghasilkan grafik bukti dan inferensi intermediate dalam model yang sama dan mungkin tidak percaya. In this work, we frame the deductive logical reasoning task by defining three modular components: rule selection, fact selection, and knowledge composition.  Aturan dan langkah pemilihan fakta memilih aturan kandidat dan fakta yang akan digunakan dan kemudian komposisi pengetahuan menggabungkannya untuk menghasilkan kesimpulan baru. Ini memastikan setia model dengan hubungan penyebab yang pasti dari langkah bukti ke alasan kesimpulan. To test our framework, we propose FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner) where the above three components are independently modeled by transformers.  Kami memperhatikan bahwa FaiRR kuat terhadap perturbasi bahasa baru, dan lebih cepat pada kesimpulan dari pekerjaan sebelumnya pada set data reasoning yang ada. Selain itu, berbeda dengan model generasi kotak hitam, kesalahan yang dibuat oleh FaiRR lebih dapat diterjemahkan karena pendekatan modular.', 'ko': '변압기는 논리 규칙 라이브러리에서 연역 추리를 실행할 수 있다는 것이 증명되었고 논리 규칙 라이브러리는 자연 언어로 작성된 규칙과 문장을 포함한다.최근의 연구에 따르면 이런 모델은 아날로그 모델의 논리적 추리 과정의 추리 절차(즉 증명도)를 생성할 수 있다.현재 이런 블랙박스 모델은 같은 모델에서 증명도와 중간 추리를 생성하기 때문에 믿을 수 없을 수도 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 세 가지 모듈화 구성 요소를 정의함으로써 연역 논리 추리 임무인 규칙 선택, 사실 선택과 지식 조합을 구축한다.규칙과 사실 선택 단계에서 사용할 후보 규칙과 사실을 선택한 다음에 지식 조합을 조합하여 새로운 추론을 생성한다.이는 증명 절차부터 추리까지 인과관계를 확정함으로써 모델의 충실성을 확보한다.우리의 프레임워크를 테스트하기 위해 우리는FaiRR(충실하고 건장한 추리기)를 제기했는데 그 중에서 상술한 세 가지 구성 요소는transformers가 독립적으로 모델링했다.우리는 FaiRR이 새로운 언어에 대한 방해가 노봉성을 가지고 있으며 추리 방면에서 이전에 기존의 추리 데이터 집합에서의 작업보다 더 빠르다는 것을 관찰했다.또한 블랙박스 생성 모델보다 모듈식 방법을 적용했기 때문에 FaiRR에서 발생한 오류는 해석하기 쉽다.', 'fa': 'تغییر\u200cدهندگان نشان داده شده\u200cاند که قادر به دلیل تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cای در یک قانون منطقی باشند که در زبان طبیعی نوشته شده\u200cاند. کارهای اخیرا نشان می دهند که این مدل\u200cها می\u200cتوانند همچنین قدم\u200cهای منطقی (یعنی گراف ثابت) را تولید کند که فرایند منطقی منطقی مدل را اثبات می\u200cکند. در حال حاضر، این مدل\u200cهای جعبه سیاه\u200cپوست هر دو گراف ثابت می\u200cکند و بین\u200cالملل\u200cهای بین\u200cالملل در یک مدل می\u200cآورند و به این\u200cصورت ممکن است بی\u200cخیانت باشد. در این کار، ما وظیفه منطقی منطقی را از طریق تعریف سه عنصر مودیولی، انتخاب قانون، انتخاب حقیقت و ترکیب علم را قانون می\u200cکنیم. قانون و برگزیدن حقیقت قدم\u200cها قانون کاندیداتی و حقیقت\u200cها را انتخاب می\u200cکنند که استفاده می\u200cشوند و سپس ترکیب دانش آنها را برای ایجاد آلودگی جدید ترکیب می\u200cکند. این مدل اعتمادی را با ارتباط دلیل مطمئن می\u200cکند از قدم مدرک به دلیل آلودگی. برای آزمایش چهارچوب ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم FaiRR (دلیل\u200cدهنده\u200cی اعتقادی و ثابت) جایی که سه قسمت بالا از طریق تغییر\u200cدهندگان به طور مستقل نمونه\u200cبندی می\u200cشوند. ما مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که FaiRR به تغییرات زبان جدید قوی\u200cتر است و سریع\u200cتر از کارهای قبلی در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای منطقی موجود است. اضافه\u200cای از این، در مقابل مدل\u200cهای تولید جعبه سیاه، اشتباه\u200cهایی که توسط FaiRR انجام می\u200cدهند، به دلیل دسترسی مودولر قابل تعبیر بیشتری هستند.', 'sw': 'Watafsiri wameonekana kuwa na uwezo wa kutekeleza sababu za kujitegemea juu ya sheria za kilogical yenye sheria na matamko yaliyoandikwa kwa lugha ya asili. Kazi za hivi karibuni zinaonyesha kuwa mifano hiyo pia inaweza kutengeneza hatua zinazoelezea (yaani, picha ya ushahidi) inayoonyesha mchakato wa kisiasa wa maana ya model i. Kwa sasa, mifano hii ya boksi nyeusi inatengeneza picha za kuthibitisha na maambukizi ya kati katika mifano hiyo na kwa hiyo inaweza kuwa haina imani. Katika kazi hii, tunatengeneza kazi yenye ufahamu wa kimaadili kwa kuelezea vifaa vitatu: utawala wa uchaguzi, uchaguzi wa ukweli, na ufahamu. Utawala na hatua za uchaguzi za ukweli zinachagua utawala wa mgombea na ukweli unaotumika na kisha kuunganisha maarifa yanaunganisha kutengeneza maambukizi mapya. Hii inahakikisha imani ya muundo kwa kuhakikisha uhusiano wa sababu kutoka hatua ya ushahidi mpaka sababu ya ugonjwa. Ili kujaribu miundombi yetu, tunapendekeza FaiRR (Msomaji Muaminifu na Msomaji wa Robust) ambapo vifaa vitatu vinavyotengenezwa huru na mabadiliko. Tunaona kwamba FaiRR anavurugwa kwa matatizo ya lugha ya kisasa, na ni haraka zaidi ya kazi zilizopita kuhusu seti za taarifa zinazoeleweka. Kwa nyongeza, tofauti na mifano ya vizazi vya boksi nyeusi, makosa yaliyofanywa na FaiRR yanatafsiriwa zaidi kutokana na mbinu za kiutaratibu.', 'tr': 'Bu terjimeler tebigy dilde ýazylan kurallar we a ýdymlar barada düşündirip biljek bolýar. Ýakyndaky i şleriň bu nusgalar näme üçin razylyk adımlary bolup biljekdigini görkez. Şu wagt şu kara kutu modelleri hem kanıt grafisini hem aynı modelde ortalamak ve bu şekilde ynamlı bolup biler. Bu işde, üç modüler parçalarını tanımlayarak mantıklı mantıklı mantıklı düşünce görevini çeviririz: kural seçimi, gerçeklik seçimi, ve bilim composasyonu. kural ve gerçeklik seçim adımları kullanılacak kandidat kurallarını ve gerçekleri seçir ve bilim toplantısı onları yeni bir aşınlık oluşturmak için birleştirir. Bu nusga çykyş sebäbi ynamly sebäpli baglaşyk bilen ynamlyklygyny garaşýar. Biziň çerýämizi barlamak üçin FaiRR (ynamly we robust sebäpleri) üçin aşakdaky üç komponentler täze bir şekilde örän görkezilýän sahypalary teklip edýäris. Biz FaiRR dillerini täze bir dil täzeliklerine güýçlidir we munuň öňki işleriň üstünde bolan sebäpli maglumatlardan has çalt däldir. Diňe, gara gutusynyň döredijili nusgalaryna has raýratyn, modul ýaryşynyň sebäbi hatalary has ýagdaýylandyr.', 'sq': 'Transformuesit janë treguar se janë në gjendje të kryejnë arsyetim përfundimtar në një bazë rregullash logjike që përmban rregulla dhe deklarata të shkruara në gjuhën natyrore. Punët e fundit tregojnë se modelet e tilla mund të prodhojnë gjithashtu hapat arsyetimi (pra, grafiku i provave) që imitojnë procesin e arsyetimit logjik të modelit. Aktualisht, këto modele me kuti të zezë gjenerojnë si grafikun e provave dhe inferencat e ndërmjetësuara brenda të njëjtit model dhe kështu mund të jenë jobesimtarë. Në këtë punë, ne e përcaktojmë detyrën e arsyetimit logjik përfundimtar duke përcaktuar tre komponente modulare: zgjedhjen e rregullave, zgjedhjen e fakteve dhe përbërjen e njohurive. The rule and fact selection steps select the candidate rule and facts to be used and then the knowledge composition combines them to generate new inferences.  Kjo siguron besimin e modelit duke siguruar lidhjen shkakuese nga hapi i provave deri në arsyetimin e përfundimit. Për të testuar kuadrin tonë, ne propozojmë FaiRR (arsyetari i besueshëm dhe i fortë) ku tre komponentet e lartë janë modeluar në mënyrë të pavarur nga transformuesit. Ne vëzhgojmë se FaiRR është i fortë ndaj shqetësimeve të gjuhës së re dhe është më i shpejtë në përfundim se punët e mëparshme mbi të dhënat ekzistuese të arsyetimit. Përveç kësaj, në kundërshtim me modelet gjenerative të kutisë së zezë, gabimet e bërë nga FaiRR janë më të interpretueshme për shkak të qasjes modulare.', 'af': "Transformeerders is vertoon om te wees in staat na uitvoer deduktiewe redening op 'n logiese reëlbalk bevat reëls en uitdrukkings geskryf in natuurlike taal. Onlangse werke wys dat sulke model e ook die redekende stappe (i.e. die bevestige graaf) wat die model se logiese redekening proses emuleer kan produseer. Opstuur, hierdie swart- boks modele genereer beide die bevestig graaf en middelde inferences binne dieselfde model en dus dalk mag ongeloof wees. In hierdie werk, ons raam die afgedruktiewe logiese redekening taak deur die definieer van drie module komponente: reël kies, feit kies en kennis komponente. Die reël en feit keuse stappe kies die kandidateerreël en fakte om gebruik te word en dan die kennis komponensie kombinieer hulle om nuwe inferensies te genereer. Hierdie verseker model getrouheid deur verseker oorsaaklike verwanting van die bevestige stap tot die inferensie redening. Om ons raamwerk te toets, voorstel ons FaiRR (Geloofde en Robust Reasoner) waar die bo drie komponente onderhoofd deur transformeerders moed word. Ons bewaar dat FaiRR kragtiger is na nuwe taal perturbasies, en is vinniger by inferensie as vorige werke op bestaande redekende datastelle. Additionally, in contrast to black- box generative models, the errors made by FaiRR are more interpretable due to the modular approach.", 'am': 'ተርጓሚዎች በጥቅረት ቋንቋ የተጻፉትን ሕግ እና ንግግሮች በሚያዙ የሎጂ ሕግ መፈታት መፈታትን በመቻል ይችላሉ፡፡ የአሁኑ ሥራ ምሳሌዎች የሞላሊካዊ ምክንያት ክፍተቶችን (ምናልባት ማስረጃ graph) የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ እነዚህ ጥቁር-box ዓይነቶች የግልጹን ቀለም እና በመካከለኛው ዓይነት ውስጥ ያሉትን ድካሞች ያስወግዳሉ፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ሦስት ተካውሎ አካባቢ አካባቢዎችን በማስተካከል እናደርጋለን፤ ምርጫ፣ የእውነት ምርጫ እና እውቀት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ The rule and fact selection steps select the candidate rule and facts to be used and then the knowledge composition combines them to generate new inferences.  ይሄ ሞዴል እውነተኛነትን ከፈተናው ደረጃ ጀምሮ እስከ ውጤት አነስተኛ ምክንያት እንዲያረጋግጥ ያረጋግጣል፡፡ ፍሬክራችንን ለመፈተን፣ በላይኛው ሦስቱ ሰነዶች በተለወጠው በመለወጥ የተመሳሳይ ፍሬም (የታመነ እና ሮቡት አንባቢ) እናሳውቃለን፡፡ FaiRR በአሁኑ ቋንቋ መቀላቀል እንደተሰናከል እና የቀድሞው የዳታ ሰርተቶች ላይ ከቀድሞ ሥራ ይልቅ ፍጥረት ይቻላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ጥቁር-box አቀማመጥ ሞዴሎችን በተለየ፣ FaiRR የተደረገው ስህተቶች በሞዴል ሥርዓት ምክንያት ይተረጉማሉ፡፡', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ ձևափոխիչները կարողանում են կատարել հանգեցնող մտածողություն բնական լեզվով գրված կանոնների և հայտարարությունների վրա: Recent works show that such models can also produce the reasoning steps (i.e., the proof graph) that emulate the model\'s logical reasoning process.  Այս սևամորթ արկղի մոդելները ստեղծում են նույն մոդելի մեջ ճշգրիտ գրաֆիկ և միջին հետևանքներ, որոնք կարող են անհավատալի լինել: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կառուցնում ենք կոնդուկտիվ տրամաբանական մտածողության խնդիրը\' որոշելով երեք մոդուլյար բաղադրիչներ\' օրենքների ընտրությունը, փաստերի ընտրությունը և գիտելիքների բաղադրությունը: Կանոնը և փաստերի ընտրության քայլերը ընտրում են թեկնածու կանոնը և օգտագործվող փաստերը, իսկ հետո գիտելիքների բաղադրությունը միավորում է դրանք նոր եզրակացություններ ստեղծելու համար: Սա ապահովում է հավատարմությունը մոդելի միջոցով վստահ պատճառային հարաբերությունը ապացույցի քայլուց մինչև եզրակացության մտածելակերպը: Մեր կառուցվածքը փորձելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք "Հավատարիմ և ուժեղ պատասխանատու", որտեղ վերևի երեք բաղադրիչները անկախ են ձևավորվում վերածողների կողմից: Մենք նկատում ենք, որ ՖեյՌ-ն ուժեղ է նոր լեզվի խառնաշփոթմների դեպքում, և ավելի արագ է եզրակացության մեջ, քան նախորդ գործերը գոյություն ունեցող մտածողական տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Ավելին, հակառակ սևամորթ արկղի ստեղծագործող մոդելներին, սխալները, որոնք արվել է ՖեյՌ-ի կողմից, ավելի շատ մեկնաբանելի են մոդուլար մոտեցումների պատճառով:', 'az': 'Təqvim dildə yazılmış qaydalar və ifadələr barəsində lojik qaydalar barəsində dəyişiklik dəyişiklik fikrini yerinə yetirə bilərlər. Son i şlər modellərin logik dəyişiklik prosesini həmçinin dəyişiklik adımlarını da ürəkləyə biləcəyini göstərir. Şu anda bu siyah qutusu modelləri həmçinin kanıt grafünü və aynı modellərdə orta düşmənləri yaradır və beləcə də inanmazlar. Bu işdə, üç modül komponenti belə tanımlayaraq, düzgün seçim, həqiqət seçim və elm komponenti yaratdıq. Qayda və əslində seçim adımları istifadə ediləcək kandidát hökmünü və faktlarını seçir və sonra bilgi kompozisyonu onları yeni dəyişiklik yaratmaq üçün birləşdirir. Bu, dəlilik adından aşağılıq dəyişikliklərinə təsdiqlənmiş səbəbi ilə modellərinin sadiqliyini təsdiqləyir. Çerçivimizi sınamaq üçün, üç komponent üstündəki səbəbdən transformatçılar tarafından modelləşdirilmiş FaiRR təklif edirik. FaiRR yeni dillərin müxtəlifliyinə güclüdür və əvvəlkilərin müxtəlifliyindən daha tezdir. Əvvəlcə, qara qutusu generativ modellərə baxmayaraq, FaiRR ilə etdikləri xətalar modular yaxınlığının səbəbi daha çox təfsil edilə bilərlər.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় লেখা নিয়ম এবং বিবৃতির বিষয়বস্তুতে ট্রান্সফর্মাররা নিজেদের নিয়ম ও বিষয়বস্তু নিয়ে নিজেদের সাম্প্রতিক কাজ দেখাচ্ছে যে এই মডেলের যৌক্তিক কারণের প্রক্রিয়া তৈরি করতে পারে (যেমন প্রমাণ গ্রাফ) যা মডেলের যৌক্তিক কারণের Currently, these black-box models generate both the proof graph and intermediate inferences within the same model and thus may be unfaithful.  এই কাজে আমরা তিনটি মডিউলিয়াল উপাদান নির্ধারণের মাধ্যমে নির্দিষ্ট বৈশিষ্ট্যিক কারণের কাজ ফ্রেম করে দেই: নির্বাচন, সত্যিকা নিয়ম এবং বাস্তবতা নির্বাচনের পদক্ষেপ নির্বাচন করে প্রার্থীর নিয়ম এবং ব্যবহার করা সত্ত্ব বেছে নিন এবং তারপর জ্ঞানের সংগঠন নত এটি নিশ্চিত মোডেল বিশ্বাস নিশ্চিত করে যে প্রমাণের কারণের কারণ থেকে দুর্ভোগের কারণ থেকে নিশ্চিত করে। আমাদের ফ্রেম পরীক্ষা করার জন্য আমরা ফেয়ারআর (বিশ্বাসী এবং রোবাস্ট পাঠক) প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে উপরের তিনটি উপাদান স্বাধীন রূপান্তর আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে ফেয়ারআর বর্তমান ভাষার বিভ্রান্তির ক্ষেত্রে ধ্বংস হয়েছে এবং বিদ্যমান কারণের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত কাজের এছাড়াও, কালো বাক্সের জেনারেটিভ মডেলের সাথে বিপরীত, ফেয়ারআরের দ্বারা ত্রুটিগুলো মডিউলিয়াল পদ্ধতির কারণে আরও ব', 'bs': 'Pokazano je da su transformatori u mogućnosti izvršiti deduktivne razgovore o logičkoj pravilima koja sadrži pravila i izjave napisane na prirodnom jeziku. Skorašnji rad pokazuje da takvi model i mogu također proizvesti razumne korake (tj. grafik dokaza) koji emuliraju logički proces razumanja modela. Trenutno, ovi crne kutije modeli generiraju dokazni grafik i prosječne inferencije unutar iste modela i mogu biti nevjerni. U ovom poslu, okrenuli smo deduktivni logički razumni zadatak definisanjem tri modularne komponenta: selekcija pravila, selekcija činjenica i komponenta znanja. Pravilo i činjenica izbora korake biraju pravilo kandidata i činjenice koje treba koristiti, a onda ih kompozicija znanja kombinira kako bi stvorila nove inferencije. To osigurava vjernost modela uvjerenim uzrokovanim odnosima od koraka dokaza do razloga infekcije. Da bismo testirali naš okvir, predlažemo FaiRR (vjerni i stabilni razlog) gdje su iznad tri komponenta nezavisno modelirani transformatori. Primijetljamo da je FaiRR jak na nove jezičke perturbacije i brže u infekciji od prethodnih radova na postojećim razumnim podacima. Pored toga, u suprotnosti sa generičnim modelima crne kutije, greške koje je napravio FaiRR su interpretabilnije zbog modularnog pristupa.', 'ca': "S'ha demostrat que els transformadors són capaços de fer raonament deductiu en una base de regles lògices que conté regles i declaracions escrites en llenguatge natural. Les recents obres mostran que aquests model s també poden produir les etapes de raonament (és a dir, el gràfic de prova) que emulen el procés de raonament lògic del model. Actualment, aquests models de caixa negra generen tant el gràfic de prova com inferències intermedies dins el mateix model i, per tant, poden ser desconfiants. En aquesta feina, encarreguem la tasca de raonament lògic deductiu definint tres components modulars: selecció de regles, selecció de fets i composició del coneixement. La regla i les etapes de selecció de fets seleccionen la regla candidata i els fets que s'han d'utilitzar i després la composició del coneixement les combina per generar noves inferències. Això assegura la fidelitat model amb una relació causal assegurada des del pas de prova fins al raonament de inferència. Per provar el nostre marc, proposem FaiRR (Reasoner Feal i Robust) on els tres components d'arriba estan modelats independentment pels transformadors. Observem que FaiRR és robust per a les perturbacions del nou llenguatge, i és més ràpid en la inferència que treballes anteriors en conjunts de dades de raonament existents. A més, a diferència dels models generadors de caixa negra, els errors de FaiRR són més interpretables a causa de l'enfocament modular.", 'et': 'Transformerid on näidanud, et nad suudavad teha deduktiivset arutlust loogilistel reeglitel, mis sisaldavad looduskeeles kirjutatud reegleid ja väiteid. Hiljutised tööd näitavad, et sellised mudelid võivad toota ka mõtlemise sammud (st tõestusgraafik), mis emuleerivad mudeli loogilist mõtlemist. Praegu tekitavad need musta kasti mudelid sama mudeli raames nii tõestusgraafiku kui ka vahepealseid järeldusi ning võivad seega olla truudusetud. Käesolevas töös raamatame deduktiivse loogilise mõtlemise ülesande, määratledes kolme moodulkomponenti: reeglite valik, faktide valik ja teadmiste kompositsioon. Reeglite ja faktide valimise etappides valitakse kasutatav kandidaadireegel ja faktid ning seejärel ühendatakse teadmiste koosseis need uute järelduste loomiseks. See tagab mudeli ustavuse kindlustatud põhjusliku seose tõendamise etapist kuni järelduse põhjendusteni. Meie raamistiku testimiseks pakume välja FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner), kus eespool nimetatud kolm komponenti on sõltumatult modelleeritud trafode abil. Me täheldame, et FaiRR on tugev uudsete keeleliste häirete suhtes ja on kiirem järelduste tegemisel kui varasemad tööd olemasolevate arutlusandmekogumite kohta. Erinevalt musta kasti generatiivsetest mudelitest on FaiRRi tehtud vead modulaarse lähenemise tõttu tõlgendatavamad.', 'cs': 'Transformátory jsou schopny provádět deduktivní uvažování na logické základě pravidel obsahující pravidla a příkazy napsané v přirozeném jazyce. Nedávné práce ukazují, že takové modely mohou také vytvářet úvahové kroky (tj. důkazní graf), které emulují proces logického uvažování modelu. V současné době tyto modely černé skříně generují jak důkazní graf, tak interference v rámci stejného modelu, a proto mohou být nevěrné. V této práci rámcujeme deduktivní logické uvažování definováním tří modulárních složek: výběr pravidel, výběr faktů a složení znalostí. Kroky výběru pravidel a faktů vybírají kandidátské pravidlo a fakta, které mají být použity, a pak je složení znalostí kombinuje k vytvoření nových závěrů. To zajišťuje věrnost modelu zajištěním příčinného vztahu od kroku důkazu k odůvodnění závěrů. Pro otestování náš framework navrhujeme FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner), kde jsou výše uvedené tři komponenty nezávisle modelovány transformátory. Pozorujeme, že FaiRR je robustní vůči novým jazykovým poruchám a je rychlejší v odvozování než předchozí práce na existujících datových sadách uvažování. Navíc, na rozdíl od generativních modelů černé skříňky, jsou chyby udělané FaiRR díky modulárnímu přístupu interpretovatelnější.', 'fi': 'Muuntajien on osoitettu pystyvän päättelemään päättelyä loogisella sääntökannalla, joka sisältää luonnollisella kielellä kirjoitettuja sääntöjä ja lauseita. Viimeaikaiset työt osoittavat, että tällaiset mallit voivat tuottaa myös päättelyvaiheet (eli todistekaavio), jotka jäljittelevät mallin loogista päättelyprosessia. Tällä hetkellä nämä mustan laatikon mallit tuottavat sekä näyttökäyrän että välijohtoja samassa mallissa ja voivat siten olla uskottomia. Tässä työssä kehystämme deduktiivisen loogisen päättelyn tehtävää määrittelemällä kolme modulaarista komponenttia: säännön valinta, faktojen valinta ja tiedon koostumus. Sääntöjen ja faktojen valintavaiheissa valitaan käytettävä ehdokassääntö ja faktat ja sitten tietokoostumus yhdistää ne uusien johtopäätösten luomiseksi. Tämä varmistaa mallin uskollisuuden varmistamalla syy-yhteyden todistusvaiheesta päättelyyn. Kehyksemme testaamiseksi ehdotamme FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner), jossa edellä mainitut kolme komponenttia mallinnetaan itsenäisesti muuntajien avulla. Havaitsemme, että FaiRR on vankka uusille kielihäiriöille ja on nopeampi päättelyssä kuin aiemmat tutkimukset olemassa olevista päättelyaineistoista. Lisäksi toisin kuin mustan laatikon generatiiviset mallit, FaiRR:n tekemät virheet ovat helpommin tulkittavissa modulaarisen lähestymistavan ansiosta.', 'ha': "An nuna shawarar da za'a iya iya iya cika zaɓen bayani da kuma ana ƙunsa da rubutun da aka rubũta cikin harshen asiyya. Yin aikin da suka sani yana nuna cewa, misãlai za'a iya iya ƙãga hanyõyin masu hankali (misali, grafyutan bayani) wanda ke ƙayyade shawarar masu inganci na motel. Aka yanzu, waɗannan misalin akwatin basa-baƙi na zaɓi both grafyutan bayani da kuma masu ƙarami cikin misali guda guda, kuma kwamfyutan za'a iya zama masu yaudara. Daga wannan aikin, muna samar da aikin da ke shawara masu so da ke ƙayyade ƙanshi uku masu tsari: shirin zaɓaɓen, zaɓaɓen gaskiya, da kuma tsarin ilmi. Rukunan da hanyoyin zaɓen gaskiya, za'a zãɓi kanarin da gaskiyar da za'a yi amfani da su kuma a sa'an nan, compositin da ilmi yana haɗa su dõmin ya zaɓi wata wagon zafi. Wannan yana kasancẽwa ga gaskiyar ayuka da za'a gaskata mutane daga matsayin jarraba zuwa fasalin na kasar hanci. Dõmin jarraba firam, za'a buƙata FaiRR (Mai gaskata da Robust) inda aka samo ƙanshin ukun da ke samansa da ɗaɗabi'a da transformers. Muna ganin FaiRR an goyi zuwa batarin lugha na yanzu, kuma yana da kashi mafi sauri ko da aikin da suka zaman a kan tsarin danasãri masu jira. Additionally, in contrast to black-box generative models, the errors made by FaiRR are more interpretable due to the modular approach.", 'jv': 'Transformer dialogs-action Dahil wih-wih, model Punika-Punika sing dumateng kuwi nggawe Perintah dumateng lan kelas barang dumateng kuwi model sing berarti lan padha iso nggawe geranggap. Genjer-Genjer Genjer-Genjer Ing iso ngobudhakan modèl kuwi ngregani soko kesempatan tentang kapan pangan Ngerti kebebasane rampung kene, kita ngubah nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk barêng-barêng nggawe Failed RR kuwi nggawe bagian perbudhakan kanggo nyumbang, lan dino sing susah-susahé karo perbudhakan kanggo masalah dataset sing sabanjuré Manculine', 'sk': 'Izkazalo se je, da so transformatorji sposobni izvajati deduktivno razmišljanje na logični bazi pravil, ki vsebuje pravila in izjave, napisane v naravnem jeziku. Nedavna dela kažejo, da lahko takšni modeli ustvarijo tudi korake razmišljanja (tj. dokazni graf), ki posnemajo proces logičnega razmišljanja modela. Trenutno ti modeli črne škatle ustvarjajo tako dokazni graf kot vmesne sklepe znotraj istega modela in so lahko nezvesti. V tem delu smo opredelili tri modularne komponente: izbira pravil, izbira dejstev in sestavo znanja. Koraki izbire pravil in dejstev izberejo pravilo kandidata in dejstva, ki jih je treba uporabiti, nato pa jih sestava znanja združuje, da ustvari nove sklepe. To zagotavlja zvestobo modela z zagotovljeno vzročno povezavo od dokaznega koraka do sklepne utemeljitve. Za testiranje našega okvira predlagamo FaiRR (Faithful and Robust Reasoner), kjer zgoraj navedene tri komponente samostojno modelirajo transformatorji. Opazujemo, da je FaiRR robusten za nove jezikovne motnje in je hitrejši pri sklepanju kot prejšnja dela na obstoječih sklepnih podatkovnih nizikih. Poleg tega so napake FaiRR zaradi modularnega pristopa bolj razložljive v nasprotju z generativnimi modeli črne škatle.', 'he': 'הוכח שהמעצבים יכולים לבצע הגיון מדלקטיבי על בסיס חוקים הגיוניים שמכיל חוקים וההצהרות שנכתבו בשפה טבעית. העבודות האחרונות מראות שדוגמנים כאלה יכולים גם לייצר את צעדים ההיגיון (כלומר, גרף ההוכחה) שמחזיקים את תהליך ההיגיון הגיוני של המודל. כרגע, דוגמני קופסה שחורה אלה יוצרים גם את הגרף ההוכחה וגרף המסקנות הביניים בתוך אותו דוגמן וכך הם עשויים להיות לא נאמנים. בעבודה הזו, אנו מסגרים את משימה ההיגיון הגיוני הנפחית על ידי הגדרת שלושה רכיבים מודולריים: בחירת חוקים, בחירת עובדות, ומרכיבת ידע. החוק והצעדים בבחירה של העובדות בוחרים את חוק המועמד ועובדות שימשכו ואז המערכת הידע משלבת אותם כדי ליצור תוצאות חדשות. זה מאבטח נאמנות מודל על ידי מערכת יחסים סיבית מאובטחת מהצעד ההוכחה עד הסיבה למסקנה. כדי לבדוק את המסגרת שלנו, אנו מציעים FaiRR (הגיון האמין והחזק) שבו שלושת המרכיבים העליונים מודלים באופן עצמאי על ידי משתנים. אנו שומרים על פייר-ר הוא חזק לפרעות שפות חדשות, והוא מהיר יותר במסקנה מאשר עבודות קודמות על קבוצות נתונים הגיוניים קיימות. בנוסף, בניגוד לדוגמאות יוצרות בקופסה שחורה, הטעויות שעשויות על ידי FaiRR ניתנות לפרש יותר בגלל הגישה המודולרית.', 'bo': 'འགྱུར་སྲོལ་བྱེད་མཁན་ལ་རང་བཞིན་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་བྲིས་པའི་སྲོལ་རིམ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་ཐུབ། ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འཆར་བ་དེ་དག་གི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་ཚོ་ཡང་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེས་པའི་གྲངས་རིམ། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་མིག་དཔེ་གནད་གནད་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་འདི་དག་གིས་མཐོང་བ་དང་རྣམ་པ་གཅིག་གི་མིག་དཔེ་བར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཅིག In this work, we frame the deductive logical reasoning task by defining three modular components: rule selection, fact selection, and knowledge composition. The rule and fact selection steps select the candidate rule and facts to be used and then the knowledge composition combines them to generate new inferences. འདིས་དཔེ་གཏོང་མཁན་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་ཁང་བའི་རྐྱེན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ཏེ། ང་ཚོའི་མདུན་གཞུང་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་FaiRR(Faithful and Robust Reasoner)ལ་བསམ་འཆར་འདོད་པའི་ཆ་ཤས་གསུམ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས ང་ཚོས་FaiRR་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག ད་དུང་། མ་དབྱིབས'}
{'en': 'CICERO A Dataset for Contextualized Commonsense Inference in Dialogues', 'ar': 'HiTab: مجموعة بيانات جدول هرمي للإجابة على الأسئلة وإنشاء اللغة الطبيعية', 'pt': 'HiTab: um conjunto de dados de tabela hierárquica para resposta a perguntas e geração de linguagem natural', 'fr': 'HitAB\xa0: Un jeu de données de table hiérarchique pour répondre aux questions et générer du langage naturel', 'es': 'HiTab: Un conjunto de datos de tablas jerárquicas para responder preguntas y generar lenguaje natural', 'ja': 'HiTab ：質問への回答と自然言語生成のための階層テーブルデータセット', 'zh': 'HiTab曰:问自然语言之分表数据集', 'hi': 'HiTab: प्रश्न उत्तर देने और प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित तालिका डेटासेट', 'ru': 'HiTab: Набор данных иерархической таблицы для ответов на вопросы и генерации естественного языка', 'ga': 'HiTab: Tacar Sonraí Tábla Ordlathach le haghaidh Freagairt Ceisteanna agus Giniúint Teanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'HiTab: un dataset di tabelle gerarchiche per la risposta alle domande e la generazione del linguaggio naturale', 'lt': 'HiTab: Hierarchinės lentelės duomenų rinkinys atsakymams į klausimus ir natūralios kalbos kūrimui', 'el': 'Ένα Ιεραρχικό σύνολο δεδομένων πίνακα για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων και τη δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'HiTab: Hierarchikus táblázatadatkészlet a kérdések megválaszolásához és a természetes nyelv generálásához', 'kk': 'HiTab: Сұрақ жауап беру және табиғи тіл жасау үшін хиерархикалық кесте деректер бағдарламасы', 'ml': 'ഹിറ്റാബ്: ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനും സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള ഒരു ഹൈരാര', 'mt': 'HiTab: Sett ta’ Dejta ta’ Tabella Erarkika għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet u l-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwa Naturali', 'mk': 'HiTab: Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'no': 'HiTab: Eit hierarkisk tabelldatabaset for svar på spørsmål og generering av naturleg språk', 'ms': 'HiTab: A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'pl': 'HiTab: Hierarchiczny zestaw danych tabeli do odpowiedzi na pytania i generowania języka naturalnego', 'mn': 'HiTab: A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'sr': 'HiTab: hijerarhički tablica podataka za odgovor na pitanja i generaciju prirodnog jezika', 'ro': 'HiTab: Un set de date de tabel ierarhic pentru răspunsul la întrebări și generarea limbajului natural', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'HiTab: A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'sv': 'HiTab: Ett hierarkiskt tabelldataset för frågesvar och generering av naturligt språk', 'ta': 'HiTab: கேள்வி பதில் மற்றும் இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்திற்கான ஒரு உயர்நிலை அட்டவணை தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'HiTab: سؤال جواب کرنے اور طبیعی زبان پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک حیرارشیک ٹیبل ڈاٹیسٹ', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'HiTab: A Hieratarchical table dataset for question Answerting and Natural Language generation', 'bg': 'Набор от данни за йерархична таблица за отговор на въпроси и генериране на естествен език', 'da': 'HiTab: Et hierarkisk tabel datasæt til spørgsmål besvarelse og natursproggenerering', 'nl': 'HiTab: Een hiërarchische tabel dataset voor het beantwoorden van vragen en het genereren van natuurlijke taal', 'hr': 'HiTab: hijerarhički tablica podataka za odgovor na pitanja i generaciju prirodnog jezika', 'de': 'HiTab: Ein hierarchischer Tabellendatensatz zur Beantwortung von Fragen und Generierung natürlicher Sprache', 'id': 'HiTab: A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'fa': 'HiTab: یک پایگاه اطلاعات میز طبیعی برای جواب سوال و تولید زبان طبیعی', 'ko': 'HiTab: Q&amp;A 및 자연 언어 생성을 위한 계층형 테이블 데이터 세트', 'sw': 'Hitab: Taarifa ya Tabaka ya Kijuu kwa ajili ya Swali Jibu na Uzalishaji wa Lugha ya asili', 'tr': 'HiTab: Sorag jogaplamak we tebigy dil Generasy üçin bir hiyerarşik täblisaň maglumaty', 'sq': 'HiTab: A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'am': 'tab-style', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Tab', 'az': 'HiTab: sual cavab vermək və Təbiətli Dil Məxluqatı üçün hiyerarşik Tabel verilənləri', 'bn': 'হিট্যাব: প্রশ্নের উত্তর এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্মের জন্য একটি হায়েরার্কিকেল টেবিল তথ্য সেট', 'bs': 'HiTab: Hierarchical Table Data Data for Question Response and Natural Language Generation', 'ca': 'HiTab: Un conjunt de dades de taula hieràrquica per respondre a preguntes i generar llenguatges naturals', 'cs': 'HiTab: Hierarchická tabulková sada dat pro zodpovězení otázek a generování přirozeného jazyka', 'et': 'HiTab: Hierarhiline tabeli andmekogum küsimustele vastamiseks ja loomuliku keele genereerimiseks', 'fi': 'HiTab: Hierarkinen taulukko kyselyihin vastaamiseen ja luonnollisen kielen luomiseen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'HiTab: A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation', 'jv': 'HiTab:', 'sk': 'HiTab: Hierarhični nabor podatkov tabele za odgovarjanje na vprašanja in ustvarjanje naravnega jezika', 'bo': 'HiTab: A Hierarchical Table Dataset for Question Answering and Natural Language Generation'}
{'en': 'This paper addresses the problem of dialogue reasoning with contextualized commonsense inference We curate CICERO a dataset of dyadic conversations with five types of utterance level reasoning based inferences cause subsequent event prerequisite motivation and emotional reaction The dataset contains 53,105 of such inferences from 5,672 dialogues We use this dataset to solve relevant generative and discriminative tasks generation of cause and subsequent event generation of prerequisite motivation and listener’s emotional reaction and selection of plausible alternatives Our results ascertain the value of such dialogue centric commonsense knowledge datasets It is our hope that CICERO will open new research avenues into commonsense based dialogue reasoning', 'pt': 'As tabelas geralmente são criadas com hierarquias, mas os trabalhos existentes sobre raciocínio de tabelas focam principalmente em tabelas planas e negligenciam tabelas hierárquicas. Tabelas hierárquicas desafiam o raciocínio numérico por meio de indexação hierárquica complexa, bem como relações implícitas de cálculo e semântica. Apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados, HiTab, para estudar a resposta a perguntas (QA) e geração de linguagem natural (NLG) sobre tabelas hierárquicas. HiTab é um conjunto de dados de domínio cruzado construído a partir de uma riqueza de relatórios estatísticos e páginas da Wikipedia, e possui características únicas: (1) quase todas as tabelas são hierárquicas e (2) os pares de controle de qualidade não são propostos por anotadores do zero, mas são revisados a partir de frases reais e significativas de autoria de analistas. (3) para revelar raciocínio numérico complexo em relatórios estatísticos, fornecemos anotações refinadas de alinhamento de quantidade e entidade.\nExperimentos sugerem que este HiTab apresenta um forte desafio para as linhas de base existentes e uma referência valiosa para pesquisas futuras. Visando a estrutura hierárquica, criamos uma forma lógica com reconhecimento de hierarquia para raciocínio simbólico sobre tabelas, que mostra alta eficácia. Visando o raciocínio da tabela, aproveitamos o alinhamento de entidade e quantidade para explorar o treinamento parcialmente supervisionado em QA e geração condicional em NLG e reduzir amplamente as previsões espúrias em QA e produzir melhores descrições em NLG.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما يتم إنشاء الجداول بتسلسلات هرمية ، لكن الأعمال الموجودة في استدلال الجدول تركز بشكل أساسي على الجداول المسطحة وتتجاهل الجداول الهرمية. تتحدى الجداول الهرمية التفكير العددي من خلال فهرسة هرمية معقدة ، وكذلك العلاقات الضمنية للحساب والدلالات. نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة ، HiTab ، لدراسة الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) وتوليد اللغة الطبيعية (NLG) عبر جداول هرمية. HiTab عبارة عن مجموعة بيانات متعددة المجالات تم إنشاؤها من مجموعة كبيرة من التقارير الإحصائية وصفحات Wikipedia ، ولها خصائص فريدة: (1) جميع الجداول تقريبًا هرمية ، و (2) أزواج ضمان الجودة لا يقترحها المعلقون من البداية ، ولكن تمت مراجعتها من جمل حقيقية وذات مغزى من تأليف المحللين. (3) للكشف عن التفكير العددي المعقد في التقارير الإحصائية ، نقدم تعليقات توضيحية دقيقة للكمية ومحاذاة الكيان.\nتشير التجارب إلى أن جهاز HiTab هذا يمثل تحديًا قويًا لخطوط الأساس الحالية ومعيارًا قيمًا للبحث في المستقبل. استهداف الهيكل الهرمي ، نبتكر نموذجًا منطقيًا مدركًا للتسلسل الهرمي للتفكير الرمزي على الجداول ، مما يظهر فعالية عالية. الاستدلال المنطقي للجدول المستهدف ، نستفيد من محاذاة الكيانات والكمية لاستكشاف التدريب الخاضع للإشراف الجزئي في ضمان الجودة والتوليد الشرطي في NLG ، وتقليل التنبؤات الزائفة في ضمان الجودة وإنتاج أوصاف أفضل في NLG إلى حد كبير.', 'es': 'Las tablas a menudo se crean con jerarquías, pero los trabajos existentes sobre el razonamiento de tablas se centran principalmente en tablas planas y descuidan las tablas jerárquicas. Las tablas jerárquicas desafían el razonamiento numérico mediante la indexación jerárquica compleja, así como las relaciones implícitas de cálculo y semántica. Presentamos un nuevo conjunto de datos, HiTab, para estudiar la respuesta a preguntas (QA) y la generación de lenguaje natural (NLG) sobre tablas jerárquicas. HiTab es un conjunto de datos entre dominios construido a partir de una gran cantidad de informes estadísticos y páginas de Wikipedia, y tiene características únicas: (1) casi todas las tablas son jerárquicas, y (2) los anotadores no proponen pares de control de calidad desde cero, sino que se revisan a partir de frases reales y significativas creadas por analistas. (3) para revelar un razonamiento numérico complejo en los informes estadísticos, proporcionamos anotaciones detalladas de la alineación de la cantidad y la entidad. \nLos experimentos sugieren que este HiTab presenta un gran desafío para las líneas de base existentes y un valioso punto de referencia para futuras investigaciones. Dirigiéndonos a la estructura jerárquica, diseñamos una forma lógica con conciencia jerárquica para el razonamiento simbólico sobre tablas, que muestra una alta eficacia. Al enfocarnos en el razonamiento de tablas, aprovechamos la alineación de entidades y cantidades para explorar la capacitación parcialmente supervisada en control de calidad y generación condicional en NLG, y reducimos en gran medida las predicciones falsas en el control de calidad y producimos mejores descripciones en NLG.', 'fr': "Les tableaux sont souvent créés avec des hiérarchies, mais les travaux existants sur le raisonnement des tableaux se concentrent principalement sur les tableaux plats et négligent les tableaux hiérarchiques. Les tableaux hiérarchiques remettent en question le raisonnement numérique par une indexation hiérarchique complexe, ainsi que par des relations implicites de calcul et de sémantique. Nous présentons un nouveau jeu de données, HitAB, pour étudier la réponse aux questions (AQ) et la génération de langage naturel (GNL) sur des tables hiérarchiques. HitAB est un jeu de données inter-domaines construit à partir d'une multitude de rapports statistiques et de pages Wikipédia, et possède des caractéristiques uniques\xa0: (1) presque tous les tableaux sont hiérarchiques, et (2) les paires d'assurance qualité ne sont pas proposées par des annotateurs à partir de zéro, mais sont révisées à partir de phrases réelles et significatives rédigées par des analystes. (3) pour révéler un raisonnement numérique complexe dans les rapports statistiques, nous fournissons des annotations précises sur la quantité et l'alignement des entités. \nLes expériences suggèrent que ce HiTAB présente un défi de taille pour les bases de référence existantes et constitue un point de référence précieux pour les recherches futures. En ciblant la structure hiérarchique, nous concevons une forme logique sensible à la hiérarchie pour un raisonnement symbolique sur des tableaux, ce qui montre une grande efficacité. En ciblant le raisonnement par table, nous tirons parti de l'alignement des entités et des quantités pour explorer la formation partiellement supervisée en assurance qualité et la génération conditionnelle dans le GNL, et réduisons considérablement les prévisions fausses dans l'AQ et produisons de meilleures descriptions dans le GNL.", 'ja': 'テーブルはしばしば階層で作成されますが、テーブル推論に関する既存の作品は主にフラットテーブルとネグレクト階層テーブルに焦点を当てています。 階層テーブルは、複雑な階層インデックス付けと、計算と意味論の暗黙の関係によって数値的推論に挑戦します。 私たちは、階層テーブル上で質問回答（ QA ）と自然言語生成（ NLG ）を研究するための新しいデータセットHiTabを提示します。 HiTabは、豊富な統計レポートとウィキペディアページから構築されたクロスドメインデータセットであり、ユニークな特徴を持っています。(1)ほとんどすべてのテーブルは階層的であり、(2) QAペアは一から注釈者によって提案されたものではなく、アナリストによって作成された実際の意味のある文章から改訂されています。(3)統計レポートで複雑な数値的推論を明らかにするために、量とエンティティの整列の細かい注釈を提供します。 \n実験によると、このHiTabは既存のベースラインにとって強力な課題であり、将来の研究のための貴重なベンチマークであることが示唆されています。 階層構造をターゲットに、表に対する記号的推論のための階層を意識した論理形式を考案し、高い有効性を示している。 テーブル推論をターゲットにして、エンティティと数量の整合性を活用して、QAの部分的に監督されたトレーニングとNLGの条件付き生成を探索し、QAの偽予測を大幅に削減し、NLGでより良い説明を生成します。', 'zh': '表常用层次结构创,而见表推理要在平表,而忽于分表。 分表因杂索引及计语义之隐式以挑战数直推理。 立一新数集HiTab,以究表对(QA)与自然语言成(NLG)。 HiTab者,大计报维基百科页面之跨域数集,有特特之征:(1)凡表皆层,(2)QA非注释者从头始,而从分析师所撰真有义句改之也。 (3)为揭计报中杂数推理,给数与实对齐细粒度注。 \n实验当HiTab挑战于见基线,而资未来之价。 夫针之结构,设层次结构之逻辑,施于对表符推理,见高有效性也。 夫针之于表也,因体数以索QA,NLG之所成,大大减少QA之虚占,而生善于NLG。', 'hi': 'तालिकाओं को अक्सर पदानुक्रमों के साथ बनाया जाता है, लेकिन तालिका तर्क पर मौजूदा कार्य मुख्य रूप से फ्लैट तालिकाओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और पदानुक्रमित तालिकाओं की उपेक्षा करते हैं। पदानुक्रमित तालिकाएं जटिल पदानुक्रमित अनुक्रमण, साथ ही गणना और शब्दार्थ के अंतर्निहित संबंधों द्वारा संख्यात्मक तर्क को चुनौती देती हैं। हम पदानुक्रमित तालिकाओं पर प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) और प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी (एनएलजी) का अध्ययन करने के लिए एक नया डेटासेट, HiTab प्रस्तुत करते हैं। HiTab एक क्रॉस-डोमेन डेटासेट है जो सांख्यिकीय रिपोर्टों और विकिपीडिया पृष्ठों के धन से निर्मित है, और इसमें अद्वितीय विशेषताएं हैं: (1) लगभग सभी तालिकाएं पदानुक्रमित हैं, और (2) क्यूए जोड़े खरोंच से एनोटेटर द्वारा प्रस्तावित नहीं हैं, लेकिन विश्लेषकों द्वारा लिखित वास्तविक और सार्थक वाक्यों से संशोधित किए जाते हैं। (3) सांख्यिकीय रिपोर्टों में जटिल संख्यात्मक तर्क को प्रकट करने के लिए, हम मात्रा और इकाई संरेखण के ठीक-ठीक एनोटेशन प्रदान करते हैं। \nप्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि यह HiTab मौजूदा बेसलाइन के लिए एक मजबूत चुनौती और भविष्य के अनुसंधान के लिए एक मूल्यवान बेंचमार्क प्रस्तुत करता है। पदानुक्रमित संरचना को लक्षित करते हुए, हम तालिकाओं पर प्रतीकात्मक तर्क के लिए एक पदानुक्रम-जागरूक तार्किक रूप तैयार करते हैं, जो उच्च प्रभावशीलता दिखाता है। तालिका तर्क को लक्षित करते हुए, हम क्यूए में आंशिक रूप से पर्यवेक्षित प्रशिक्षण और एनएलजी में सशर्त पीढ़ी का पता लगाने के लिए इकाई और मात्रा संरेखण का लाभ उठाते हैं, और काफी हद तक क्यूए में नकली भविष्यवाणियों को कम करते हैं और एनएलजी में बेहतर विवरण का उत्पादन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Таблицы часто создаются с иерархиями, но существующие работы по рассуждению таблиц в основном сосредоточены на плоских таблицах и пренебрегают иерархическими таблицами. Иерархические таблицы оспаривают численное обоснование сложной иерархической индексацией, а также неявные соотношения вычислений и семантики. Мы представляем новый набор данных, HiTab, для изучения ответов на вопросы (QA) и генерации естественного языка (NLG) за иерархическими таблицами. HiTab - это междоменный набор данных, созданный из множества статистических отчетов и страниц Википедии, и имеет уникальные характеристики: (1) почти все таблицы иерархичны, и (2) пары QA не предлагаются аннотаторами с нуля, а пересматриваются из реальных и значимых предложений, авторами которых являются аналитики. (3) чтобы выявить сложные численные рассуждения в статистических отчетах, мы предоставляем мелкозернистые аннотации количества и выравнивания сущностей. \nЭксперименты показывают, что эта HiTab представляет серьезную проблему для существующих базовых линий и является ценным эталоном для будущих исследований. Ориентируясь на иерархическую структуру, мы разрабатываем осознаваемую иерархией логическую форму символического рассуждения над таблицами, что показывает высокую эффективность. Таргетируя рассуждения по таблицам, мы используем выравнивание сущностей и количеств для изучения частично контролируемого обучения QA и условной генерации в NLG, и в значительной степени уменьшаем ложные прогнозы в QA и производим лучшие описания в NLG.', 'ga': 'Is minic a chruthaítear táblaí le hordlathas, ach dírítear go príomha ar tháblaí comhréidh agus ar tháblaí ordlathacha faillí sna hoibreacha atá ann faoi láthair ar réasúnaíocht táblaí. Tugann táblaí ordlathacha dúshlán don réasúnaíocht uimhriúil trí innéacsú ordlathach casta, chomh maith le gaolmhaireachtaí intuigthe idir ríomh agus shéimeantaic. Cuirimid tacar sonraí nua i láthair, HiTab, chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar fhreagairt ceisteanna (QA) agus giniúint nádúrtha teanga (NLG) thar táblaí ordlathacha. Is tacar sonraí tras-fearainn é HiTab a tógadh as an iliomad tuarascálacha staitistiúla agus leathanaigh Vicipéide, agus tá tréithe uathúla aige: (1) táblaí ordlathacha beagnach gach ceann acu, agus (2) ní mholann na nótaíadóirí péirí QA ón tús, ach déantar athbhreithniú orthu ó abairtí fíor agus brí arna n-údar ag anailísithe. (3) chun réasúnaíocht chasta uimhriúil a nochtadh i dtuarascálacha staidrimh, soláthraímid nótaí mínghlana ar chainníocht agus ar ailíniú aonáin.\nTugann turgnaimh le fios go dtugann an HiTab seo dúshlán láidir do bhunlínte reatha agus tagarmharc luachmhar do thaighde amach anseo. Agus muid ag díriú ar an struchtúr ordlathach, ceapaimid foirm loighciúil atá feasach ar ordlathas le haghaidh réasúnaíochta siombalach thar táblaí, a léiríonn ardéifeachtúlacht. Ag díriú ar réasúnaíocht tábla, déanaimid giaráil aonáin agus ailíniú cainníochta chun oiliúint pháirt-mhaoirsithe i QA agus giniúint choinníollach i NLG a iniúchadh, agus laghdaítear den chuid is mó réamh-mheastacháin bhréagacha i QA agus táirgimid tuairiscí níos fearr in NLG.', 'el': 'Οι πίνακες συχνά δημιουργούνται με ιεραρχίες, αλλά τα υπάρχοντα έργα σχετικά με τη συλλογιστική των τραπεζών επικεντρώνονται κυρίως σε επίπεδες πίνακες και παραμελούν τους ιεραρχικούς πίνακες. Οι ιεραρχικοί πίνακες αμφισβητούν την αριθμητική συλλογιστική με σύνθετη ιεραρχική ευρετηρίαση, καθώς και τις έμμεσες σχέσεις υπολογισμού και σημασιολογίας. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων, για να μελετήσουμε την απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις (QA) και τη δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας (NLG) πάνω από ιεραρχικούς πίνακες. Το είναι ένα σύνολο δεδομένων μεταξύ τομέων κατασκευασμένο από έναν πλούτο στατιστικών αναφορών και σελίδων της Βικιπαίδειας, και έχει μοναδικά χαρακτηριστικά: (1) σχεδόν όλοι οι πίνακες είναι ιεραρχικοί, και (2) τα ζεύγη QA δεν προτείνονται από σχολιαστές από το μηδέν, αλλά αναθεωρούνται από πραγματικές και ουσιαστικές προτάσεις που συντάχθηκαν από αναλυτές. (3) για να αποκαλύψουμε πολύπλοκο αριθμητικό σκεπτικό στις στατιστικές εκθέσεις, παρέχουμε λεπτόκοκκα σχόλια της ευθυγράμμισης ποσοτήτων και οντοτήτων.', 'hu': 'A táblázatokat gyakran hierarchiával hozzák létre, de a meglévő táblázatérveléssel foglalkozó munkák elsősorban lapos asztalokra összpontosítanak, és figyelmen kívül hagyják a hierarchikus táblákat. A hierarchikus táblázatok komplex hierarchikus indexeléssel, valamint implicit számítási és szemantikai kapcsolatokkal kihívják a numerikus érvelést. Bemutatunk egy új adatkészletet, a HiTab-ot, amely hierarchikus táblázatokon keresztül tanulmányozza a kérdések megválaszolását (QA) és a természetes nyelv generálását (NLG). A HiTab egy tartományközi adatkészlet, amely számos statisztikai jelentésből és Wikipédia oldalból készült, és egyedi jellemzőkkel rendelkezik: (1) szinte minden táblázat hierarchikus, és (2) a minőségi értékelést nem a jegyzetelők javasolják a semmiből, hanem valós és értelmes mondatokból módosítják az elemzők által készített. (3) A statisztikai jelentések komplex numerikus érvelésének feltárása érdekében finomszemcsés megjegyzéseket biztosítunk a mennyiség és entitás igazításáról.', 'ka': 'ტაბლეები ზოგიერთად იერაქტიებით შექმნია, მაგრამ არსებობს მაგილის არსებულობაში სამუშაოდ ტაბლეტური ტაბლეტებზე და იერაქტიკური ტაბლეტებზე გადა ჰიერარიქული ტაბლოები მრიცხველი პარამენტირებას კომპლექსიკური იერარიქტიკური ინდექსირება, და ინფლიქტიკური კალკულაციების და სიმენტიკის შესახებ. ჩვენ ახალი მონაცემების საქაღალდე HiTab-ს გავაკეთებთ, რომ კითხვების პასუხი (QA) და თავისუფალური ენის განვითარება (NLG) იერაქტიკალური ცხლაზე. HiTab არის სტატისტიკური შეტყობინებების და Wikipedia გვერდების ბედნიერებაზე შექმნილი მონაცემები, და იქნება უნიკალური პერატისტები: (1) ბედნიერად ყველა გვერდები იერატიკურია, და (2) QA ზოგები არ იერატიკურია შეტყობინებული მონაცემებების შემ (3) სტატისტიკური შეტყობინებში კომპლექსი რიცხვულ პარამეტრების გაჩვენება, ჩვენ გვეუბნება კომპლექსი რიცხვულ პარამეტრები და ინტერტიკური დაწყ', 'it': "Le tabelle sono spesso create con gerarchie, ma i lavori esistenti sul ragionamento dei tavoli si concentrano principalmente su tavole piatte e trascurano le tabelle gerarchiche. Le tabelle gerarchiche sfidano il ragionamento numerico attraverso complesse indicizzazioni gerarchiche, così come le relazioni implicite di calcolo e semantica. Presentiamo un nuovo dataset, HiTab, per studiare la risposta alle domande (QA) e la generazione del linguaggio naturale (NLG) su tabelle gerarchiche. HiTab è un set di dati cross-domain costruito da una ricchezza di rapporti statistici e pagine Wikipedia, e ha caratteristiche uniche: (1) quasi tutte le tabelle sono gerarchiche, e (2) le coppie QA non sono proposte dagli annotatori da zero, ma sono riviste da frasi reali e significative scritte dagli analisti. (3) per rivelare complessi ragionamenti numerici nei rapporti statistici, forniamo annotazioni a grana fine di allineamento della quantità e dell'entità.", 'kk': 'Кестелер әдетте иерархиялармен құрылады, бірақ кестелердің сезімінде бар жұмыс істейді, негізінде қарапайым кестелер мен иерархиялық кестелерді елемейді. Гиерархикалық кестелер комплекс иерархиялық индекстеу және есептеу және семантикалық қатынастар бойынша санды түсініктемеледі. Ейерархиялық кестелерден жауап беру (QA) және табиғи тілді құру (NLG) үшін жаңа деректер жинағын HiTab көрсетедік. HiTab - статистикалық хабарламалар мен Википедия парақтардан құрылған бірнеше доменнің деректер жинағы, бірақ бірнеше қасиеттері бар: (1) барлық кестелер иерархиялық, және (2) QA жинағын жазушылардан жазылмайды, бірақ анализтердің автор етілген шын және маңызды сөздерден қайта (3) Статистикалық хабарламалардың комплексті сандардың түсініктерін көрсету үшін, біз санды және бірліктердің түсініктерін жақсы жазып береміз.', 'mk': 'Табелите честопати се создаваат со хиерархии, но постојните дела на размислување на масата се фокусираат главно на рамни маси и забораваат хиерархички маси. Хиерархичните таблички го предизвикуваат броевното размислување со комплексно хиерархичко индексирање, како и имплицитните односи на пресметка и семантика. Презентираме нови податоци, HiTab, за да проучуваме одговори на прашања (QA) и генерација на природен јазик (NLG) преку хиерархични табли. HiTab е крстодомен датотек изграден од богатство статистички извештаи и страници на Википедија, и има уникатни карактеристики: (1) скоро сите таблии се хиерархични, и (2) парови QA не се предложени од нула од анотаторите, туку се ревидирани од реални и значајни реченици авторирани од аналитичарите. (3) to reveal complex numerical reasoning in statistical reports, we provide fine-grained annotations of quantity and entity alignment.', 'lt': 'Lentelės dažnai sukuriamos hierarchijomis, tačiau dabartiniai stalo pagrindimo darbai daugiausia susiję su plokščiomis lentelėmis ir hierarchinių lentelių aplaida. Hierarchinės lentelės ginčija skaitmeninį pagrįstumą sudėtingu hierarchiniu indeksu, taip pat netiesioginius skaičiavimo ir semantikos santykius. Pateikiame naują duomenų rinkinį, HiTab, kad per hierarchines lenteles išnagrinėtume klausimų atsakymą (QA) ir natūralių kalbų kūrimą (NLG). HiTab yra įvairių domenų duomenų rinkinys, sudarytas iš daugybės statistinių ataskaitų ir Wikipedia puslapių, turintis unikalių savybių: 1) beveik visos lentelės yra hierarchinės, o 2) QA poros ne iš nulio siūlomos anotatorių, bet peržiūrimos iš tikrųjų ir reikšmingų analitikų autorių sakinių. (3) statistinėse ataskaitose atskleidžiant sudėtingą skaičių pagrįstumą, pateikiame smulkias kiekio ir subjektų suderinimo anotacijas.', 'ms': 'Jadual sering dicipta dengan hierarki, tetapi kerja yang ada pada alasan meja terutama fokus pada jadual rata dan mengabaikan jadual hierarki. Hierarchical tables challenge numerical reasoning by complex hierarchical indexing, as well as implicit relationships of calculation and semantics.  Kami perkenalkan set data baru, HiTab, untuk mempelajari jawapan soalan (QA) dan generasi bahasa alam (NLG) melalui jadual hierarkis. HiTab adalah set data melintas-domain dibina dari banyak laporan statistik dan halaman Wikipedia, dan mempunyai ciri-ciri unik: (1) hampir semua jadual adalah hierarkis, dan (2) pasangan QA tidak diusulkan oleh annotator dari awal, tetapi diubah-ubah dari kalimat yang sebenar dan bermakna yang dibuat oleh analis. (3) untuk mengungkapkan alasan numerik kompleks dalam laporan statistik, kami menyediakan anotasi yang sempurna kuantiti dan penyesuaian entiti.', 'ml': 'Tables are often created with hierarchies, but existing works on table reasoning mainly focus on flat tables and neglect hierarchical tables.  ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക് ടേബിളുകള്\u200d ചികിത്രങ്ങളുടെ സംഖ്യകങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടും, കണക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും സെമാന്റിക്കുകളുടെയും ഉള്ള ബന ഹിറ്റാബ്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം പഠിക്കാന്\u200d (ക്യൂഎ) പിന്നെ സ്വാഭാവി ഹിറ്റാബ് ഒരു ക്രോസ്റ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിക്കും വിക്കിപീഡിയയുടെ താളുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ക്രിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസ്റ്റേറ്റ് ആണ്. അതിന്റെ വ്യക്തിപരമാ (3) സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള അക്കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നമ്മള്\u200d വിശിഷ്ടമായ വിവരങ്ങളും', 'mt': 'It-tabelli ta’ spiss jinħolqu b’ġerarkiji, iżda x-xogħlijiet eżistenti fuq ir-raġunament fuq il-mejda jiffukaw prinċipalment fuq tabelli ċatti u tabelli ġerarkiji li jiġu injorati. It-tabelli ġerarkiċi jisfidaw ir-raġunament numeriku permezz ta’ indiċjar ġerarkiku kumpless, kif ukoll relazzjonijiet impliċiti ta’ kalkolu u semantika. Aħna nippreżentaw sett ġdid ta’ dejta, HiTab, biex nistudjaw it-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) u l-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali (NLG) fuq tabelli ġerarkiċi. HiTab huwa sett ta’ dejta transdomestiku mibni minn bosta rapporti statistiċi u paġni tal-Wikipedia, u għandu karatteristiċi uniċi: (1) kważi t-tabelli kollha huma ġerarkiċi, u (2) il-pari QA mhumiex proposti minn annotaturi mill-bidu, iżda huma riveduti minn sentenzi reali u sinifikanti awtorizzati mill-analisti. (3) biex niżvelaw raġunament numeriku kumpless fir-rapporti statistiċi, nagħtu annotazzjonijiet fini tal-kwantità u l-allinjament tal-entità.', 'no': 'Tabeller blir ofte oppretta med hierarkitet, men eksisterande arbeider på tabelle- rasjonar hovudsakelig fokuserer på flate tabeller og ignorerer hierarkitelle tabeller. Hierariske tabeller utfordrer numerisk rasjon ved kompleks hierarkisk indeksering, og implisitt forhold til kalkulasjon og semantikk. Vi presenterer ei ny dataset, HiTab, for å studera spørsmålssvar (QA) og naturspråksgenerasjon (NLG) over hierarkiske tabeller. HiTab er eit krysdomenedatasett konstruert frå ein rygge av statistiske rapporter og Wikipedia-sider, og har unike karakteristikk: (1) nesten alle tabeller er hierarkiske, og (2) QA-par vert ikkje foreslått av annotatorar frå skrått, men vert gjenoppretta frå reale og meningsteikn autoriserte av analysar. (3) for å oppdaga komplekse numeriske rasjonar i statistiske rapporter, gir vi fjerne merknader om kvantitet og entitetsjustering.', 'pl': 'Tabele są często tworzone z hierarchią, ale istniejące prace nad rozumowaniem tabel koncentrują się głównie na płaskich tabelach i zaniedbują tabele hierarchiczne. Tabele hierarchiczne wyzwalają rozumowanie numeryczne poprzez złożone indeksowanie hierarchiczne, a także ukryte relacje obliczeń i semantyki. Przedstawiamy nowy zestaw danych, HiTab, do badania odpowiedzi na pytania (QA) i generowania języka naturalnego (NLG) w tabelach hierarchicznych. HiTab jest zestawem danych o wielu domenach zbudowanym z bogactwa raportów statystycznych i stron Wikipedii i posiada unikalne cechy: (1) prawie wszystkie tabele są hierarchiczne, a (2) pary jakości nie są proponowane przez adnotatorów od zera, ale są poprawiane na podstawie rzeczywistych i znaczących zdań autorskich przez analityków. (3) Aby ujawnić złożone rozumowanie numeryczne w raportach statystycznych, dostarczamy drobnoziarniste adnotacje wyrównania ilości i jednostek.', 'mn': 'Хүснэгт ихэвчлэн дүрслэлтэй бий болдог. Гэхдээ хүснэгт дээр байгаа ажиллууд ихэвчлэн төвөгтэй хүснэгт дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Хиерархик хүснэгт комплекс дүрслэлийн индекс, тооцоолох, семантикийн холбоотой холбоотой тооцоололтоор тооцооллоор шаардлагатай. Бид шинэ өгөгдлийн санг HiTab-аар илэрхийлэх асуулт хариулт (QA) болон байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний хүснэгт дээр судалж өгдөг. HiTab бол статистикийн мэдээллээс болон Википедийн хуудас баян бүтээгдэхүүнээс бүтээгдэхүүнтэй олон тооны өгөгдлийн сангууд ба бараг бүх хүснэгт нь шинжлэх ухаан, 2) QA хоёрыг шинжлэх ухаанаас зориулагдаггүй, гэхдээ шинжлэх ухаанагчид зөв болон утгатай өгүүлбэрээс шинэчлэгдэ (3) Статистикийн мэдээллээр комплекс тоон ойлголтыг харуулахын тулд бид хэмжээний тоо болон нэгжээний тусламжтайгаар дүгнэгдэж байна.', 'ro': 'Tabelele sunt adesea create cu ierarhii, dar lucrările existente pe raționamentul tabelului se concentrează în principal pe tabele plate și neglijează tabelele ierarhice. Tabelele ierarhice provoacă raționamentul numeric prin indexarea ierarhică complexă, precum și relațiile implicite de calcul și semantică. Vă prezentăm un nou set de date, HiTab, pentru a studia răspunsul la întrebări (QA) și generarea limbajului natural (NLG) peste tabele ierarhice. HiTab este un set de date cross-domain construit dintr-o multitudine de rapoarte statistice și pagini Wikipedia, și are caracteristici unice: (1) aproape toate tabelele sunt ierarhice, și (2) perechile QA nu sunt propuse de adnotatori de la zero, ci sunt revizuite din fraze reale și semnificative autorizate de analiști. (3) pentru a dezvălui raționamentul numeric complex în rapoartele statistice, oferim adnotări fine de aliniere cantitativă și entități.', 'sr': 'Tablete su često stvorene s hijerarhijom, ali postojeći rad na raspravu stola uglavnom se fokusiraju na ravne stolove i zanemaruju hijerarhijske stolove. Hijerarhički stolovi izazivaju brojne rasprave kompleksnom hijerarhičkom indeksiranjem, kao i implicitne veze računanja i semantika. Predstavljamo novi set podataka, HiTab, da proučimo odgovor na pitanje (QA) i prirodnu generaciju jezika (NLG) preko hijerarhijskih stolova. HiTab je komplet podataka preko domena izgrađen iz bogatstva statističkih izveštaja i Wikipedia stranica, i ima jedinstvene karakteristike: 1) skoro svi stolovi su hijerarhički, a (2) QA pare ne predlažu annotatori iz ogrebotine, nego se pregledaju iz pravih i značajnih rečenica koje su autorisali analitičari. (3) kako bi otkrili kompleksno brojno razumljivanje u statističkim izveštajima, obezbeđujemo dobre oznake količine i poravnanja entiteta.', 'si': 'ටේබල් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂය සමඟ සිද්ධ වෙනවා, නමුත් තියෙන්නේ ටේබල් සිද්ධ විශේෂයෙන් වැඩ කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂ හියරාචික් ටේබල් අභ්\u200dයාගයක් සංකේතික අභ්\u200dයාගයක් වෙනුවෙන් සංකේත සංකේතික සංකේතය, සහ සංකේත සම්බන්ධතා අපි අළුත් දත්ත සෙට්, හිටැබ්, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න (QA) සහ ස්වභාවික භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණය (NLG) විශ්වාස කරන්න. hitab is a cross-domain data set building from a rich report and Wikipedia pagesName (3) සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක වාර්තාවේ සංශ්\u200dය අංශ්\u200dය අංශ්\u200dය සාධාරණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අංශ්\u200dය සං', 'so': "Jardiinooyinka waxaa inta badan lagu sameeyaa hierarkiisa, laakiin shaqooyinka ku jira miiska sababtoo ah sida ugu horeysa ku kalsoonaan looxyada bannaanka iyo ka jeeda looxyada hierarkiisa. Miisadaha hierarkiisa waxay dhibaataysan yihiin sababo tiro badan oo ku saabsan kaararka hierarchikada, sidoo kale xiriirka ku saabsan xisaabta iyo semantika. Waxaan keenaynaa sawir cusub oo macluumaad ah, HiTab, si aan u barno su'aalo jawaabta (QA) iyo qarniga afka dabiiciga ah (NLG) oo ku qoran looxyada hierarchical. HiTab waa macluumaad kore ah oo laga dhisay taariikhda iyo buugaagta Wikipedia, waxayna leedahay wax gaar ah: (1) ugu dhowr looxyada oo dhan waa hierarchical, iyo (2) QA labadooda looma soo jeedo wax ku saabsan karta, laakiin waxaa laga soo bedelay erayo dhab ah oo macluumaad leh oo analyaalayaal qoray. (3) Si aan u muujinno sababo adag oo kala duduwan ee warqadaha takhasuska ah, waxaynu siinaynaa cadaalad iyo isbedelka.", 'sv': 'Tabeller skapas ofta med hierarkier, men befintliga arbeten om tabellresonemang fokuserar främst på platta tabeller och försummar hierarkiska tabeller. Hierarkiska tabeller utmanar numeriskt resonemang genom komplex hierarkisk indexering, liksom implicita relationer mellan beräkning och semantik. Vi presenterar en ny datauppsättning, HiTab, för att studera frågesvar (QA) och naturspråk generation (NLG) över hierarkiska tabeller. HiTab är en datauppsättning över domäner konstruerad från en mängd statistiska rapporter och Wikipedia sidor, och har unika egenskaper: (1) nästan alla tabeller är hierarkiska, och (2) QA-par föreslås inte av kommentatorer från grunden, men revideras från verkliga och meningsfulla meningar skrivna av analytiker. (3) För att avslöja komplexa numeriska resonemang i statistiska rapporter, tillhandahåller vi finkorniga noteringar av kvantitet och entitetsjustering.', 'ta': 'அட்டவணைகள் பெரும்பாலாக hierarchies உடன் உருவாக்கப்படுகிறது, ஆனால் தற்போதைய செயல்கள் அட்டவணையில் இருக்கும் ஏனெனில் முக்கியமாக முதலி உயர்நிலை அட்டவணைகள் சிக்கலான காரணங்களைக் கொண்டு சவால் செய்கிறது, மற்றும் கணிப்பு மற்றும் அரைப்புருவின் தொடர்புகளையும். நாம் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பு, HiTab, கேள்வி பதில் (QA) மற்றும் இயல்பான மொழி தலைமுறை (NLG) அட்டவணைகளின் மேல் படிக்க வேண்டும். HiTab is a cross-domain data set constructed from a wealth of statistical reports and Wikipedia pages, and has unique characteristics: (1) nearly all tables are hierarchical, and (2) QA ஜோடிகள் is not proposed by annotators from scratch, but is revised from real and meaningful words by analysts. (3) புள்ளிவிவரங்களில் சிக்கலான எண்ண காரணங்களை வெளிப்படுத்த, நாம் நன்றாக கிடைக்கப்பட்ட அளவு மற்றும் பொருள் ஒழுங்குபட', 'ur': 'ٹیبل اکثر سطح کے ساتھ پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں، لیکن ٹیبل پر موجود عمل کرتے ہیں، زیادہ سطح ٹیبل پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں اور سطح ٹیبل پر غفلت کرتے ہیں. ہیر ریشیک ٹیبلز تعداد کے منظور سے تعداد کے منظور سے چلنے لگتے ہیں، اور تعداد اور سمانتریک کے منظور سے بھی. ہم نے ایک نئی ڈاٹ سٹ، HiTab، سؤال کے جواب (QA) اور طبیعی زبان نسل (NLG) کے ذریعے سؤال کی تلاوت کرنے کے لئے اضافہ کیا ہے۔ HiTab ایک کرس ڈومین ڈاٹ سٹ ہے جو ایک ایسٹیسٹی راپوروٹ اور ویکیپیڈیا صفحے سے بنایا گیا ہے، اور اس کے پاس مختلف ویکیپیڈیا صفحے ہیں: (1) تقریباً تمام ٹیبل حیراتیکی ہیں، اور (2) QA جفت کو اسکرے سے نوٹاتوروں کے ذریعہ سے پیشنهاد نہیں کیا جاتا، بلکہ وہ واقعی اور مطلوب کلمات سے پھیرے (3) مقدار ریپورٹوں میں پیچیدہ تعداد کی نظریں ظاہر کرنے کے لئے ہم بہترین دانے کی تعداد اور انٹیوں کی تعداد کے مطابق مطابق کرتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Jadvallar oddiy hierarcha bilan yaratilmoqda, ammo mavjud vazifalar jadvalda eng asosida flat jadvallarga fokuslash va hierarchical jadvallarni eʼtibor berilmadi. Name Biz yangi maʼlumotlar sahifasini hierarchik jadvallarga javob berish (QA) va tabiiy tilning javobi yaratish uchun yangi maʼlumotlar sahifasini o'rganamiz. HiTab - statistical haqida va Wikipedia sahifalaridan bir nechta tarkibi maʼlumotlar tarkibi va uning xususiyatlari bor: (1) yaqinda hamma jadvallar hierarchik, va (2) QA parchalari taʼminlovchilar bilan ishlatilmaydi, balki analytikalar yaratgan haqiqiqiy va ma'lumot soʻzlaridan qayta oʻzgartiriladi. (3) to reveal complex numerical reasoning in statistical reports, we provide fine-grained annotations of quantity and entity alignment.", 'vi': 'Những cái bàn được tạo ra bởi các cấp dưới, nhưng những tác phẩm đang tồn tại trên bàn làm lý lẽ chủ yếu tập trung vào bàn phẳng và bỏ mặc các bảng phân cấp. Các bảng hướng dẫn thách thức lập trình số nhờ chi tiết thứ tự phân cấp phức tạp, cũng như mối quan hệ tính toán và ngữ pháp ngầm. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập tin mới, HiTab, để nghiên cứu câu hỏi trả lời (QA) và sản xuất ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLI) trên các bảng phân cấp. HiTab là một tập tin thập tự chế được xây dựng từ một số báo cáo thống kê và trang Wikipedia, và có các đặc điểm độc đáo: 1) gần như tất cả các bảng đều là bề dưới, và (2) các câu cá nhân không được giới hạn đề xuất bởi các nhà biên bản, mà được sửa lại từ các câu thật và ý nghĩa do các nhà phân tích. (3) để tiết lộ lý do số phức tạp trong báo cáo thống kê, chúng tôi cung cấp chú thích về lượng và thực thể thẳng hàng.', 'bg': 'Таблиците често се създават с йерархии, но съществуващите работи по разсъждаване на таблици се фокусират главно върху плоски таблици и пренебрегват йерархичните таблици. Йерархичните таблици предизвикват числовото разсъждаване чрез сложно йерархично индексиране, както и имплицитни връзки на изчисление и семантика. Представяме нов набор от данни, който изучава отговора на въпроси (Отговор на въпроси) и генерирането на естествен език (НЛГ) върху йерархични таблици. ХиТаб е междудомейнен набор от данни, изграден от множество статистически отчети и страници в Уикипедия, и има уникални характеристики: (1) почти всички таблици са йерархични и (2) двойките за оценка на качеството не се предлагат от анотатори от нулата, а се преразглеждат от реални и смислени изречения, автори на анализатори. (3) за да разкрием сложни числови разсъждения в статистическите отчети, ние предоставяме фини анотации за подреждане на количеството и същността.', 'hr': 'Tablete su često stvorene s hijerarhijom, ali postojeći radovi na razumijevanju stola uglavnom se fokusiraju na ravne stolice i zanemaruju hijerarhijske stolice. Hijerarhijske tablice izazivaju brojno razumjevanje kompleksnom hijerarhijskom indeksiranjem, kao i implicitne veze računala i semantika. Predstavljamo novi set podataka, HiTab, kako bi proučavali odgovor na pitanje (QA) i generaciju prirodnog jezika (NLG) na hijerarhijskim stolovima. HiTab je komplet podataka preko domena izgrađen iz bogatstva statističkih izvješća i stranica Wikipedia, i ima jedinstvene karakteristike: 1) gotovo svi stolovi su hijerarhički, a 2) par QA ne predlažu annotatori iz ogrebotine, već se pregledaju iz pravih i značajnih rečenica koje su autorisali analitičari. (3) kako bi otkrili kompleksno brojno razumljivanje u statističkim izvještajima, pružamo dobre oznake količine i poravnanja entiteta.', 'nl': "Tabellen worden vaak gemaakt met hiërarchieën, maar bestaande werken over tafelredeneren richten zich voornamelijk op platte tabellen en verwaarlozen hiërarchische tabellen. Hierarchische tabellen dagen numerieke redenering uit door complexe hiërarchische indexering, evenals impliciete relaties van berekening en semantiek. We presenteren een nieuwe dataset, HiTab, om vragen beantwoorden (QA) en natuurlijke taal generatie (NLG) te bestuderen over hiërarchische tabellen. HiTab is een cross-domein dataset opgebouwd uit een schat aan statistische rapporten en Wikipedia pagina's, en heeft unieke kenmerken: (1) bijna alle tabellen zijn hiërarchisch, en (2) QA paren worden niet door annotators vanaf nul voorgesteld, maar worden herzien op basis van echte en betekenisvolle zinnen geschreven door analisten. (3) om complexe numerieke redenering in statistische rapporten te onthullen, bieden we fijnkorrelige annotaties van kwantiteit en entiteitsuitlijning.", 'da': 'Tabeller oprettes ofte med hierarkier, men eksisterende værker om tabelræsonnement fokuserer primært på flade tabeller og forsømmer hierarkiske tabeller. Hierarkiske tabeller udfordrer numerisk ræsonnement ved kompleks hierarkisk indeksering samt implicitte relationer mellem beregning og semantik. Vi præsenterer et nyt datasæt, HiTab, til at studere spørgsmål besvarelse (QA) og naturlig sproggenerering (NLG) over hierarkiske tabeller. HiTab er et datasæt på tværs af domæner konstrueret ud fra et væld af statistiske rapporter og Wikipedia-sider, og har unikke karakteristika: (1) næsten alle tabeller er hierarkiske, og (2) QA-par foreslås ikke af kommentatorer fra bunden, men revideres fra reelle og meningsfulde sætninger forfattet af analytikere. (3) for at afsløre komplekse numeriske ræsonnementer i statistiske rapporter giver vi finkornede noteringer af mængde- og entitetsjustering.', 'de': 'Tabellen werden oft mit Hierarchien erstellt, aber bestehende Arbeiten zum Tabellendenken konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf flache Tabellen und vernachlässigen hierarchische Tabellen. Hierarchische Tabellen fordern numerisches Denken durch komplexe hierarchische Indexierung sowie implizite Beziehungen von Berechnung und Semantik heraus. Wir präsentieren einen neuen Datensatz, HiTab, um Fragen zu beantworten (QA) und natürliche Sprachgenerierung (NLG) über hierarchische Tabellen zu untersuchen. HiTab ist ein domänenübergreifender Datensatz, der aus einer Fülle von statistischen Berichten und Wikipedia-Seiten aufgebaut ist und einzigartige Eigenschaften aufweist: (1) Fast alle Tabellen sind hierarchisch, und (2) QA-Paare werden nicht von Annotatoren von Grund auf vorgeschlagen, sondern anhand realer und aussagekräftiger Sätze von Analysten überarbeitet. (3) Um komplexe numerische Überlegungen in statistischen Berichten aufzudecken, bieten wir detaillierte Anmerkungen zur Quantität- und Entitätsausrichtung.', 'id': 'Tabel sering diciptakan dengan hierarki, tetapi pekerjaan yang ada pada alasan meja terutama fokus pada meja rata dan mengabaikan meja hierarkis. Tabel hierarkis menantang alasan numerik dengan indeksi hierarkis kompleks, serta hubungan implicit dari kalkulasi dan semantik. Kami mempersembahkan set data baru, HiTab, untuk mempelajari jawaban pertanyaan (QA) dan generasi bahasa alam (NLG) di atas tabel hierarkis. HiTab adalah set data cross-domain yang dibuat dari banyak laporan statistik dan halaman Wikipedia, dan memiliki karakteristik unik: (1) hampir semua tabel adalah hierarkis, dan (2) pasangan QA tidak diusulkan oleh annotator dari nol, tetapi diubah dari kalimat nyata dan berarti yang ditulis oleh analis. (3) untuk mengungkapkan alasan numerik kompleks dalam laporan statistik, kami menyediakan anotasi yang baik dari kuantitas dan penyesuaian entitas.', 'fa': 'Tables are often created with hierarchies, but existing works on table reasoning mainly focus on flat tables and ignore hierarchical tables. میز های هیراریکی با توجه به دلیل تعدادی با توجه کردن قانونی پیچیده و رابطه\u200cهای معمولی محاسبات و سیمانتیک چالش می\u200cکنند. ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید، HiTab را برای مطالعه جواب سوال (QA) و نسل زبان طبیعی (NLG) بر روی میز\u200cهای طبیعی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. HiTab یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای مختلف دامنه\u200cای است که از ثروت گزارش\u200cهای آمار و صفحه\u200cهای ویکیپدیا ساخته شده است، و ویکیپدیا ویکیپدیا ویکیپدیا ویکیپدیا ویکیپدیا است، و تقریباً همه میز\u200cها دامنه\u200cای هستند، و (2) جفت\u200cهای QA توسط آشنا\u200cکنندگان از خاکستری پیشنهاد نمی\u200cشود، بلکه از جمله\u200c (3) برای نشان دادن دلیل تعدادی پیچیده در گزارش های آمار، ما نویسندگی\u200cهای دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای از تعداد و تنظیم سازی entities را می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Mifuko mara nyingi hutengenezwa na makundi, lakini imekuwepo kazi kwenye meza kwa sababu ya kuona hasa lengo la meza za bure na kusahau meza za za hierarchy. Hierarchical tables challenge numerical reasoning by complex hierarchical indexing, as well as implicit relationships of calculation and semantics.  Tunaweza kuweka seti mpya ya data, HiTab, kujifunza maswali yanayojibu jibu la lugha (QA) na kizazi cha asili (NLG) juu ya meza za za kisasa. HiTab ni seti ya taarifa za ndani zilizotengenezwa kutoka kwa utajiri wa taarifa za takwimu na kurasa za Wikipedia, na ina utaalam wa kipekee: (1) karibu kila meza ni za kikatili, na (2) wawili wa QA hawapendekezwi na wataalamu kutoka kwenye vifaa vya habari, lakini wanapitishwa upya kutoka kwenye hukumu halisi na yenye maana iliyoandikwa na wachambuzi. (3) Kuonyesha sababu tatizo katika taarifa za takwimu, tunatoa matatizo mazuri ya kiasi kikubwa na usafiri wa entity.', 'tr': 'Täbler köplenç iýerarhiýa bilen döredilýär, ýöne bar işleri täblisaň üstünde üýtget täbliklerde fokus edýär we iýerarhiýaly täbliklerde boýun gaýd etýär. Hijerarşik täblikler karmaşık hijerarşik indeksiýa tarapyndan, hasaplamak we semantik baglaýyşlaryny çalyşyrýar. Biz täze bir veri setir, HiTab, hierarşik täblikleriň üstünde soraglary jogap bermek üçin (QA) we tebigy dil döretmek üçin ybaratdyk. HiTab statistik raporlardan we Wikipedia sahypalardan inşa edilen cross-domain veri setidir we munyň beýleki karakterleridir: (1) täze ähli stollar hijerarhiýaly we (2) QA çiftleri ýüzünden ýazylýan sözlerniň tarapyndan teklip edilmedi, ýöne analystler tarapyndan ýazylýan hakyky we möhüm sözlerniň terjime edildi. (3) Statistik raporlarda karmaşık sanal mantıklary ortaya çıkarmak üçin, güýçlü şekilde miktarda we millet çyzygynyň sözleşmelerini saýlýarys.', 'ko': '표는 통상적으로 차원 구조로 만들어졌지만 기존의 표 추리 작업은 주로 평면표에 집중되어 차원 구조표를 소홀히 했다.차원표는 복잡한 차원 인덱스와 계산과 의미의 은식 관계를 통해 수치 추리에 도전한다.우리는 층표상의 문답(QA)과 자연언어 생성(NLG)을 연구하는 데 사용되는 새로운 데이터 세트 HiTab을 제시했다.HiTab은 전역 데이터 집합으로 대량의 통계 보고서와 위키백과 페이지로 구축된 독특한 특징을 가지고 있다. (1) 거의 모든 표는 층으로 나뉘어져 있다. (2) QA는 주석자가 처음부터 제기한 것이 아니라 분석가가 작성한 진실하고 의미 있는 문장을 수정한 것이다.(3) 통계 보고서에서 복잡한 수치 추리를 밝히기 위해 우리는 수량과 실체가 일치하는 세립도 주석을 제공했다.', 'af': "Tabelle word dikwels geskep met hierarkies, maar bestaande werke op tabel redering fokus hoofsaaklik op platte tabelle en verwerk hierarkies tabelle. Hierarkiske tabelle uitdruk numeriese redekening deur kompleks hierarkies indeksering en implisite verhouding van berekening en semantieke. Ons stel 'n nuwe datastel, HiTab, om vraag antwoord te ondersoek (QA) en natuurlike taal generasie (NLG) oor hierarkies tabelle. HiTab is 'n kruisdomein datastel wat van 'n rykdom van statistiese raporte en Wikipedia bladsye gebou is, en het unieke karakteristieke: (1) naby alle tabelle is hierarkies, en (2) QA paar word nie voorgestel deur annotators van skrap nie, maar word hersien van reël en betekenlike teikens wat deur analiseerders geskryf is nie. (3) om kompleks numeriese redenings in statistiese raporte te openbaar, verskaf ons fyn-graagde notasies van quantitate en entiteite-alignment.", 'sq': 'Tables are often created with hierarchies, but existing works on table reasoning mainly focus on flat tables and neglect hierarchical tables.  Tabelat hierarkike sfidojnë arsyetimin numerik me indeksimin hierarkik kompleks si dhe marrëdhëniet implicite të llogaritjeve dhe semantikës. Ne paraqesim një set të ri të dhënash, HiTab, për të studiuar përgjigjen e pyetjeve (QA) dhe gjenerimin e gjuhës natyrore (NLG) mbi tabelat hierarkike. HiTab është një grup i të dhënave ndërtuar nga një shumicë raportesh statistike dhe faqesh të Wikipedias dhe ka karakteristika unike: (1) pothuajse të gjitha tabelat janë hierarkike dhe (2) çiftet QA nuk propozohen nga anotatorët nga zero, por revizuan nga fjalimet reale dhe të kuptueshme të autoruara nga analistët. (3) për të zbuluar arsyetimin numerik kompleks në raportet statistike, ne ofrojmë anotacione të hollësishme të sasisë dhe rregullimit të njësisë.', 'am': 'ሠንጠረዥዎች ብዙ ጊዜ በአየር ማህበረሰብ ይፈጠራሉ፤ ነገር ግን የሚኖሩት ሥራ በመሠረቱ ላይ በመጠቀም ላይ በመጠቀም በመጠቀም ላይ በሚያስተክሉ ገበታዎች እና የhierarchical ገበታዎች ተሳትተዋል፡፡ Hierarchical tables challenge numerical reasoning by complex hierarchical indexing, as well as implicit relationships of calculation and semantics.  አዲስ የዳታ setup HiTab (QA) እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ትውልድ (NLG) በአርያክስቲክ ገበታዎች ላይ ለመምረጥ እናስባለን፡፡ Hitab የተለየ የድምፅ ዳታዎችን ከስቲካዊ ሪፖርት እና Wikipedia ገጾች ሀብት የተደረገ እና የተለየ ምርጫዎች አለበት:(1) ሁሉም ሰንበታዎች hierarchical ናቸው (2) የQA ዓይነቶች ከክፈት የተመሳሳይ እና በተመሳሳይዎቹ የተጻፈ እውነተኛ እና አዋቂ ቃላት ተደጋግሟል፡፡ (3) በተስታሪካ ሪፖርት ውስጥ የተቃውሞ አካባቢ ምክንያት ለማሳየት፣ ቁጥጥር እና አካባቢ ማሰናከል እና ማሰናከል እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Տափսերը հաճախ ստեղծվում են հիերարխիաների միջոցով, բայց գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքները սեղանի մտածողության վրա հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են հարթ սեղանների վրա և անտեսում են հիերարխիկական սեղանները Հիերարխիկական աղյուսակները մարտահրավեր են տալիս թվային մտածելակերպը բարդ հիերարխիկական ինդեքսի միջոցով, ինչպես նաև հաշվարկների և սեմանտիկայի ենթարկված հարաբերություններով: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր տվյալների համակարգ, ՀիՏաբ, որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք հարցերի պատասխանը (QA) և բնական լեզվի սերունդը (ՆԼԳ) հիերարխիկ աղյուսակների վրա: ՀիTab-ը մի խաչբնապատկերային տվյալների համակարգ է, որը կառուցվում է վիճակագրական զեկույցներից և Վիքիփեդիայի էջերից, և ունի յուրահատուկ հատկություններ: (1) գրեթե բոլոր աղյուսակները հիերարխիկ են, և (2) QA զույգերը չեն առաջարկում գրողների կողմից զրոյից, այլ վերանայվում են վերլուծված իրական (3) վիճակագրական զեկույցներում բացահայտելու համար բավականին բարդ թվային մտածելակերպ, մենք տրամադրում ենք նրբագեղ նշումներ քանակությամբ և միավորների հավասարման մասին:', 'az': 'Səfələr sık-sık hiyerarhiyatla yaradılır, amma mövcuddur səfərdə işlər çox düz masalar üzərində odaqlanır və hiyerarhiyat masaları unutdurur. Hiyerarşik tabletler kompleks hiyerarşik indeksi ilə numerik razılaşmalarını və hesablama və semantik əlaqələrini çəkir. Biz hiyerarşik tabletler üzərində soruşmaq üçün yeni verilən qurğu HiTab göstəririk. HiTab Statistik raportların və Wikipedia sayfalarının çoxluğundan inşa edilmiş çoxlu domena verilən bir qurdur, və təkcə bütün masalar hiyerarşik deyildir, və (2) QA çiftləri çəkilənlərdən təbliğ edilməz, ancaq analistlərdən yazılmış həqiqət və anlamlı cümlələrdən yenidən dəyişdirildir. (3) Statistik raporlarında kompleks sayı dəyişiklikləri açıq etmək üçün, biz müəyyən sayı və dəyişiklik düzəltməsini təmin edirik.', 'bn': 'টেবিল প্রায়শই হিয়ারার্কি দ্বারা তৈরি করা হয়, কিন্তু বর্তমান টেবিলের উপর বিদ্যমান কাজ করা হয়েছে যেহেতু মূলত ফ্ল্যাট টেবিল হিয়ারেরাক্কিল টেবিলের সংখ্যালয়ের কারণের চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে জটিল হিয়েরারাক্কিল সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সূচ আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট হিট্যাব উপস্থাপন করি হিরার্কিক টেবিলের উপর প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউ) এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্ম (এনএলজি)  হিট্যাব হচ্ছে পরিসংখ্যানের সমৃদ্ধ সংবাদ এবং উইকিপিডিয়া পাতা থেকে নির্মাণিত একটি ক্রাস ডাটাসেট, এবং তার বিশেষ চরিত্র রয়েছে: (1) প্রায় সকল টেবিল হিয়েরার্কিয়ার্কিয়াল এবং (2) কিউএ জো (৩) পরিসংখ্যান প্রতিবেদনে জটিল সংখ্যানের কারণ প্রকাশ করার জন্য, আমরা পরিমাণ এবং বস্তুর সামান্য সংখ্যার বিষয়টিকে ভালো ক', 'bs': 'Tablete su često stvorene s hijerarhijom, ali postojeći radovi na razumijevanju stola uglavnom se fokusiraju na ravne stolice i zanemaruju hijerarhijske stolice. Hijerarhički stolovi izazivaju brojne razgovore kompleksnom hijerarhičkom indeksiranjem, kao i implicitne veze računala i semantika. Predstavljamo novi set podataka, HiTab, da proučimo odgovor na pitanje (QA) i generaciju prirodnog jezika (NLG) na hijerarhijskim stolovima. HiTab je komplet podataka preko domena izgrađen iz bogatstva statističkih izvješća i stranica Wikipedia, i ima jedinstvene karakteristike: 1) skoro svi stolovi su hijerarhički, a 2) par QA ne predlažu annotatori iz ogrebotine, već se pregledaju iz pravih i smislenih rečenica koje su autorisali analitičari. (3) kako bi otkrili kompleksno brojno razmišljanje u statističkim izvještajima, predstavljamo novčane annotacije količine i poravnanja entiteta.', 'ca': "Les taules sovint es creen amb jerarquies, però les obres existents en el raonament de taula es centren principalment en taules planes i ignoren les taules jerarquiques. Les taules hieràrquiques desafian el raonament numèric a través d'indexació hieràrquica complexa, com també les relacions implícites de càlcul i semàntica. Presentam un nou conjunt de dades, HiTab, per estudiar respostes a preguntes (QA) i generació de llenguatges naturals (NLG) sobre taules jeràrquiques. HiTab is a cross-domain dataset constructed from a wealth of statistical reports and Wikipedia pages, and has unique characteristics: (1) nearly all tables are hierarchical, and (2) QA pairs are not proposed by annotators from scratch, but are revised from real and meaningful sentences authored by analysts.  (3) to reveal complex numerical reasoning in statistical reports, we provide fine-grained annotations of quantity and entity alignment.", 'cs': 'Tabulky jsou často vytvářeny s hierarchiemi, ale existující práce na uvažování tabulek se zaměřují především na ploché tabulky a zanedbávají hierarchické tabulky. Hierarchické tabulky zpochybňují numerické uvažování složitým hierarchickým indexováním, stejně jako implicitními vztahy výpočtu a sémantiky. Představujeme novou datovou sadu HiTab pro studium odpovědí na otázky (QA) a generování přirozeného jazyka (NLG) v hierarchických tabulkách. HiTab je datová sada napříč doménami sestavená z mnoha statistických zpráv a stránek Wikipedie a má jedinečné vlastnosti: (1) téměř všechny tabulky jsou hierarchické a (2) Páry QA nejsou navrhovány anotátory od začátku, ale jsou revidovány z reálných a smysluplných vět vytvořených analytiky. (3) Pro odhalení komplexního numerického uvažování ve statistických zprávách poskytujeme jemné anotace kvantitativního a entitního zarovnání.', 'et': 'Tabelid luuakse sageli hierarhiatega, kuid olemasolevad tööd tabelite arutlemisel keskenduvad peamiselt lamedatele tabelitele ja jätavad hierarhialised tabelid tähelepanuta. Hierarhilised tabelid vaidlustavad numbrilise arutluse keeruka hierarhilise indekseerimise ning arvutuse ja semantika kaudsete seoste kaudu. Esitleme uut andmekogumit HiTab, et uurida hierarhiliste tabelite abil küsimustele vastamist (QA) ja looduskeele genereerimist (NLG). HiTab on valdkondadevaheline andmekogum, mis on ehitatud paljudest statistilistest aruannetest ja Wikipedia lehekülgedest ning millel on unikaalsed omadused: (1) peaaegu kõik tabelid on hierarhilised ja (2) kvaliteedi tagamise paare ei paku annotaatorid nullist peale, vaid neid vaadatakse läbi reaalsete ja tähenduslike lausete põhjal, mille autorid on analüütikud. (3) et avaldada statistilistes aruannetes keerulist numbrilist arutlust, pakume kvantiteetide ja olemite vastavuse täpseid märkmeid.', 'fi': 'Taulukot luodaan usein hierarkialla, mutta olemassa olevat taulukon päättelytyöt keskittyvät pääasiassa litteisiin taulukoihin ja laiminlyövät hierarkkisia taulukoita. Hierarkiset taulukot haastavat numeerisen päättelyn monimutkaisella hierarkisella indeksoinnilla sekä implisiittisillä laskenta- ja semantiikkayhteyksillä. Esittelemme uuden HiTab-aineiston, joka tutkii kysymyksiä (QA) ja luonnollisen kielen generointia (NLG) hierarkkisten taulukoiden avulla. HiTab on monialainen tietojoukko, joka on rakennettu useista tilastoraporteista ja Wikipedia-sivuista, ja sillä on ainutlaatuisia ominaisuuksia: (1) lähes kaikki taulukot ovat hierarkkisia, ja (2) laadunvarmistusparit eivät ehdota tyhjästä, vaan ne tarkistetaan analyytikoiden laatimista todellisista ja merkityksellisistä lauseista. (3) paljastaaksemme monimutkaisen numeerisen päättelyn tilastoraporteissa, tarjoamme hienojakoisia merkintöjä määrä- ja entiteettilinjauksesta.', 'ha': "An ƙiƙira zanen akwatin bayanin hirariyaiki ko da yawa, kuma amma yana da aiki wanda ke jira a kan zanen tabar, yana da muhimmi a kan filayen flat da kuma ana ƙyale juyin hierrchical. Tabulan na Hirariki na tsãge masu matsayi da matsayin alƙaluma da muhimman indeksi mai tsanani, da sami da danganta masu buƙata na ƙidãyar da sakanti. We present a new dataset, HiTab, to study question answering (QA) and natural language generation (NLG) over hierarchical tables.  HiTab yana da wani danne-danne na guda-Domen wanda aka gina daga multi-rubutun takardar statistical, da kuma yana da wasu masu ƙayyade: (1) nesta duk abubuwan su ne hierrchical, kuma (2) QA bã za'a goyya da su zama masu bastarwa daga rubutu, kuma amma ana kure daga tsarin gaske da masu hankali da aka rubũta na analyza. (3) Dõmin ka bayyana masu saka masu ƙidãya cikin akan da aka ƙayyade, za'a gaura masu ƙidãya wa tsarin da kuma masu cikin daidaita.", 'he': 'שולחנות נוצרות לעתים קרובות עם הייררכיות, אך עבודות קיימות על הגיון שולחן מתמקדות בעיקר על שולחנות שולחנות שונות ולהזהיר שולחנות הייררכיות. שולחנות היררכיות מאתגרות בהיגיון מספרי באמצעות אינדקס היררכי מורכב, כמו גם יחסים מילויים של חישובים וסמנטיקה. אנחנו מציגים קבוצת מידע חדשה, HiTab, כדי ללמוד תשובות לשאלות (QA) ודור שפה טבעית (NLG) על שולחנות היררכיות. HiTab הוא קבוצת נתונים בין שטחים שנבנה מעשיר של דיווחים סטטיסטיים ודפי ויקיפדיה, ויש לה אופיינים ייחודיים: (1) כמעט כל השולחנות הן הייררכיות, ו (2) זוגות QA לא מציעות על ידי ציונים מאפס, אלא משופעות משפטים אמיתיים וממשמעותיים שהוספרו על ידי אנליסטים. (3) כדי לחשוף הסיבה מספרית מורכבת בדו"חות סטטיסטיים, אנחנו מספקים ציונים עצומים של כמות ויותות.', 'jv': 'tab Piranti-Piranti sing Kita menehi dataset sing gawe, HiTab, kanggo disimpen respon (qA) lan kelangan langkung sajamah (NLG) oleh basa sing akeh akeh-akeh basa. hidden (3) Ngawe Perintah Pangaki nggawe barang akeh numaral sing berarti dadi, kita ngomongke nggawe barang akeh barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kotang karo numaral sing berarti.', 'sk': 'Tabele so pogosto ustvarjene z hierarhijami, obstoječa dela na področju razmišljanja tabel pa se osredotočajo predvsem na ravne tabele in zanemarjajo hierarhične tabele. Hierarhične tabele izzivajo numerično razmišljanje s kompleksnim hierarhičnim indeksiranjem ter implicitnimi relacijami izračuna in semantike. Predstavljamo nov nabor podatkov, HiTab, za preučevanje odgovarjanja na vprašanja (QA) in generiranja naravnega jezika (NLG) prek hierarhičnih tabel. HiTab je meddomenski nabor podatkov, zgrajen iz številnih statističnih poročil in strani Wikipedije, in ima edinstvene značilnosti: (1) skoraj vse tabele so hierarhične, in (2) parov kakovosti ne predlagajo označevalci iz nič, ampak so revidirani iz resničnih in smiselnih stavkov, ki jih avtorirajo analitiki. (3) da bi v statističnih poročilih razkrili kompleksno numerično razmišljanje, zagotavljamo natančne opombe poravnave količine in entitet.', 'bo': 'Tables are often created with hierarchies, but existing works on table reasoning mainly focus on flat tables and neglect hierarchical tables. Hierarchical tables challenge numerical reasoning by complex hierarchical indexing, as well as implicit relationships of calculation and semantics. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གི་HiTab་ལ་ཡིག་མཛུབ་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་ནང་དུ་གནད་སྒྲུང་ལ་ལན་གསལ་ཞིག HiTab is a cross-domain dataset constructed from a wealth of statistical reports and Wikipedia pages, and has unique characteristics: (1) nearly all tables are hierarchical, and (2) QA pairs are not proposed by annotators from scratch, but are revised from real and meaningful sentences authored by analysts. (3) སྙན་ཞུ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཨང་གྲངས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'A Comparative Study of Faithfulness Metrics for Model Interpretability Methods', 'ar': 'توصية الطبيب في منتديات الصحة عبر الإنترنت عبر Expertise Learning', 'es': 'Recomendación de médicos en foros de salud en línea a través del aprendizaje especializado', 'pt': 'Recomendação de médicos em fóruns de saúde on-line por meio do aprendizado especializado', 'fr': "Recommandation d'un médecin dans les forums de santé en ligne via l'apprentissage", 'ja': '専門知識学習を介したオンライン健康フォーラムにおける医師の勧告', 'zh': '以专业知识学荐医于在线康论坛', 'ru': 'Рекомендации врача на онлайн-форумах по здравоохранению через обучение экспертизе', 'hi': 'विशेषज्ञता सीखने के माध्यम से ऑनलाइन स्वास्थ्य मंचों में डॉक्टर की सिफारिश', 'ga': 'Moladh Dochtúra i bhFóraim Sláinte Ar Líne trí Shaineolas', 'ka': 'ექსპერტის სწავლების გამოყენებაში რეკუმენტირება online Health Forums', 'hu': 'Orvosi ajánlás az online egészségügyi fórumokon a szakértői tanulás segítségével', 'el': 'Σύσταση γιατρού σε φόρουμ υγείας μέσω της μάθησης εμπειρογνωμοσύνης', 'kk': 'Эксперт оқыту арқылы онлайн саулық форумында доктор рекомендациясы', 'it': "Raccomandazione del medico nei forum di salute online tramite l'apprendimento delle competenze", 'lt': 'Doktoriaus rekomendacija internetiniuose sveikatos forumuose pasitelkiant ekspertų mokymąsi', 'mk': 'Докторска препорака во онлајн форуми за здравство преку експертизно учење', 'ml': 'വിശേഷം പഠിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Rakkomandazzjoni tat-tabib fil-Forums tas-Saħħa Online permezz tat-Tagħlim tal-Esperti', 'ms': 'Rekomendasi Doktor dalam Forum Kesehatan Online melalui Pelajaran Eksperti', 'mn': 'Онлайн эрүүл мэндийн форумын эмч нарын зөвлөгөө', 'ro': 'Recomandarea medicului în forumurile online de sănătate prin învățarea expertizei', 'sr': 'Preporuka doktora u online zdravstvenim forumima putem učenja eksperta', 'no': 'Doktoranbefaling i online helseforum via ekspertlæring', 'pl': 'Zalecenie lekarza w online forach zdrowia poprzez uczenie się ekspertyzy', 'si': 'ඩොක්ටර් ප්\u200dරශානයක් අන්ලයාන් ස්වාස්ත්වය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශානය කරනවා', 'sv': 'Rekommendation av läkare i hälsoforum online via expertinlärning', 'ta': 'Doctor Recommendation in Online Health Forums via Expertise Learning', 'so': 'Soo talinta dhakhtarka ee internetka caafimaadka via Expertise Learning', 'ur': 'اکسپرٹیز سیکھنے کے ذریعے اولاین سلامتی فورموں میں ڈاکٹر کی سفارش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bác sĩ kiến nghị trực tuyến về ngành sức khỏe qua giáo dục chuyên nghiệp', 'bg': 'Докторска препоръка в онлайн здравни форуми чрез експертно обучение', 'hr': 'Preporuka liječnika u online zdravstvenim forumima putem učenja stručnjaka', 'nl': 'Aanbeveling van artsen in online gezondheidsfora via expertiseleren', 'da': 'Lægeanbefaling i online sundhedsforum via ekspertise læring', 'de': 'Ärztliche Empfehlung in Online-Gesundheitsforen durch Expertenlernen', 'id': 'Rekomendasi Dokter di Forum Kesehatan Online melalui Belajar Eksperti', 'fa': 'توصیف دکتر در فورمهای سلامتی آنلاین با طریق یادگیری مطالعات', 'ko': '전문 지식 학습을 통해 온라인 건강 포럼에서 의사를 추천하다', 'sw': 'Tayarishwa kwa daktari katika Jukwaa la Afya mtandaoni kupitia Elimu', 'af': 'Dokter Aanvaring in Online Health Forums deur Experts Learning', 'sq': 'Rrekomandimi i doktorit në forumet e shëndetësisë në internet nëpërmjet Mësimit të Ekspertëve', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Saglyk Forumlarynda Lukman Mazmunlary', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Առողջապահության առցանց ֆորումների բժիշկների խորհուրդը փորձարկման միջոցով', 'az': 'Ekspertiz √Ėyr…ônm…ôsi vasit…ôsil…ô ńįnternet SańülamlńĪq ForumlarńĪnda Doktor T√∂vsiy…ô', 'bn': 'বিশেষজ্ঞ শিক্ষা মাধ্যমে অনলাইন স্বাস্থ্য ফোরামে ডাক্তার পরামর্শ', 'bs': 'Preporuka doktora u online zdravstvenim forumima putem učenja stručnjaka', 'ca': "Recomendació del metge en foros de salut en línia mitjançant l'aprenentatge d'experiències", 'cs': 'Doporučení lékařů v online zdravotních fórech prostřednictvím odborného vzdělávání', 'et': 'Arsti soovitus online tervise foorumites ekspertide õppe kaudu', 'fi': 'Lääkärin suositus online-terveysfoorumeilla asiantuntemuksen oppimisen kautta', 'he': 'המלצה הרופאית בפורומים בריאות באינטרנט באמצעות לימוד מומחה', 'jv': 'Mix Radio', 'sk': 'Priporočilo zdravnika v spletnih zdravstvenih forumih prek strokovnega učenja', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྨན་པ་ཚོས་སྨན་པ་ཞིག་གི་ཞབས་ཏོག་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་ཅན་གྱི་གྲོང་ཆེན་སྤྲོད་ན།'}
{'en': 'Interpretable methods to reveal the internal reasoning processes behind machine learning models have attracted increasing attention in recent years To quantify the extent to which the identified interpretations truly reflect the intrinsic decision making mechanisms various faithfulness evaluation metrics have been proposed However we find that different faithfulness metrics show conflicting preferences when comparing different interpretations Motivated by this observation we aim to conduct a comprehensive and comparative study of the widely adopted faithfulness metrics In particular we introduce two assessment dimensions namely diagnosticity and complexity Diagnosticity refers to the degree to which the faithfulness metric favors relatively faithful interpretations over randomly generated ones and complexity is measured by the average number of model forward passes According to the experimental results we find that sufficiency and comprehensiveness metrics have higher diagnosticity and lower complexity than the other faithfulness metrics', 'ar': 'يتم إنشاء كميات ضخمة من استفسارات المرضى يوميًا في المنتديات الصحية عبر الإنترنت ، مما يجعل التخصيص اليدوي للطبيب مهمة كثيفة العمالة. لمساعدة المرضى بشكل أفضل ، تدرس هذه الورقة مهمة جديدة لتوصية الطبيب لتمكين الاقتران التلقائي للمريض بالطبيب ذي الخبرة ذات الصلة. بينما تركز معظم الأعمال السابقة في التوصية على نمذجة المستخدمين المستهدفين من سلوكهم السابق ، لا يمكننا الاعتماد إلا على الكلمات المحدودة في الاستعلام لاستنتاج احتياجات المريض لأسباب تتعلق بالخصوصية. لنمذجة الطبيب ، نقوم بدراسة التأثيرات المشتركة لملفاتهم الشخصية والحوارات السابقة مع المرضى الآخرين واستكشاف تفاعلاتهم من خلال التعلم الذاتي. يتم استخدام حفلات زفاف الطبيب المتعلم أيضًا لتقدير قدراتهم في التعامل مع استعلام المريض باستخدام آلية انتباه متعددة الرؤوس. لإجراء التجارب ، يتم جمع مجموعة بيانات واسعة النطاق من Chunyu Yisheng ، وهو منتدى صحي صيني عبر الإنترنت ، حيث يعرض نموذجنا أحدث النتائج ، ويتفوق على خطوط الأساس فقط في النظر في الملفات الشخصية والحوارات السابقة لتوصيف الطبيب.', 'es': 'Diariamente se generan enormes volúmenes de consultas de pacientes en los foros de salud en línea, lo que hace que la asignación manual de médicos sea una tarea laboriosa. Para ayudar mejor a los pacientes, este artículo estudia una nueva tarea de recomendación del médico para permitir el emparejamiento automático de un paciente con un médico con experiencia relevante. Si bien la mayoría de los trabajos anteriores de recomendación se centran en modelar a los usuarios objetivo a partir de su comportamiento anterior, solo podemos confiar en las palabras limitadas de una consulta para inferir las necesidades de un paciente por motivos de privacidad. Para el modelado médico, estudiamos los efectos conjuntos de sus perfiles y diálogos previos con otros pacientes y exploramos sus interacciones a través del autoaprendizaje. Las incorporaciones de doctores aprendidos se emplean además para estimar sus capacidades de manejo de una consulta del paciente con un mecanismo de atención de múltiples cabezales. Para los experimentos, se recopila un conjunto de datos a gran escala de Chunyu Yisheng, un foro de salud en línea chino, donde nuestro modelo exhibe los resultados más avanzados, superando las líneas de base que solo consideran perfiles y diálogos pasados para caracterizar a un médico.', 'fr': "D'énormes volumes de demandes de patients sont générés quotidiennement sur les forums de santé en ligne, ce qui rend la répartition manuelle des médecins une tâche laborieuse. Afin de mieux aider les patients, cet article étudie une nouvelle tâche de recommandation médicale pour permettre l'appariement automatique d'un patient avec un médecin possédant l'expertise appropriée. Alors que la plupart des travaux antérieurs en matière de recommandation se concentrent sur la modélisation des utilisateurs cibles à partir de leur comportement passé, nous ne pouvons nous appuyer que sur les mots limités d'une requête pour déduire les besoins d'un patient pour des raisons de confidentialité. Pour la modélisation médicale, nous étudions les effets conjoints de leurs profils et des dialogues précédents avec d'autres patients et explorons leurs interactions via l'auto-apprentissage. Les intégrations de médecins savants sont également utilisées pour estimer leurs capacités à traiter une requête d'un patient avec un mécanisme d'attention à plusieurs têtes. Pour les expériences, un ensemble de données à grande échelle est collecté auprès de Chunyu Yisheng, un forum de santé en ligne chinois, où notre modèle présente des résultats de pointe, surpassant les bases de référence uniquement en tenant compte des profils et des dialogues antérieurs pour caractériser un médecin.", 'pt': 'Grandes volumes de consultas de pacientes são gerados diariamente em fóruns de saúde on-line, tornando a alocação manual de médicos uma tarefa trabalhosa. Para ajudar melhor os pacientes, este artigo estuda uma nova tarefa de recomendação médica para permitir o emparelhamento automático de um paciente a um médico com experiência relevante. Embora a maioria dos trabalhos anteriores de recomendação se concentre na modelagem de usuários-alvo a partir de seu comportamento anterior, só podemos confiar nas palavras limitadas em uma consulta para inferir as necessidades de um paciente por motivos de privacidade. Para modelagem de médicos, estudamos os efeitos conjuntos de seus perfis e diálogos anteriores com outros pacientes e exploramos suas interações via autoaprendizagem. As incorporações de médicos aprendidas são empregadas ainda para estimar suas capacidades de lidar com uma consulta de paciente com um mecanismo de atenção de várias cabeças. Para experimentos, um conjunto de dados em larga escala é coletado do Chunyu Yisheng, um fórum de saúde online chinês, onde nosso modelo exibe os resultados de última geração, superando as linhas de base apenas considerando perfis e diálogos anteriores para caracterizar um médico.', 'ja': 'オンラインヘルスフォーラムでは、毎日膨大な量の患者の問い合わせが生成され、手動での医師の割り当てが労働集約的なタスクになります。 患者をより良く支援するために、本論文では、患者と関連する専門知識を持つ医師との自動ペアリングを可能にするための医師推奨の新しいタスクを研究する。 推奨事項の過去の作業のほとんどは、過去の行動からターゲットユーザーをモデリングすることに焦点を当てていますが、プライバシー上の理由から患者のニーズを推測するためには、クエリ内の限定された単語のみに依存することができます。 ドクターモデリングでは、他の患者とのプロファイルと以前の対話の共同効果を研究し、自己学習を通じて相互作用を探る。 学習した医師の埋め込みは、多頭注意メカニズムを用いて患者の問い合わせを処理する能力を推定するためにさらに使用される。 実験のために、大規模なデータセットは中国のオンラインヘルスフォーラムであるChunyu Yishengから収集されます。そこでは、当社のモデルは最先端の結果を示し、ベースラインを上回っており、医師を特徴付けるためにプロファイルと過去の対話のみを考慮しています。', 'zh': '在线康论坛日成大患,此使手动医分而为劳动密集型务也。 为善助患者,本文究新任,使与专业知识自配对。 虽多前所荐举,皆集从向用户行事中建模,但凭询其有限单词以推其所以隐私。 夫医之建模,论其个人资料与前之所与言者同,而自学索其互动。 益用学者嵌以度其用多头察其能。 实验于中国在线康论坛Chunyu Yisheng大集,式展先进,优基线惟个人资料旧对以表医。', 'hi': 'रोगी प्रश्नों की बड़ी मात्रा दैनिक ऑनलाइन स्वास्थ्य मंचों पर उत्पन्न होती है, जो मैनुअल डॉक्टर आवंटन को श्रम-गहन कार्य प्रदान करती है। रोगियों की बेहतर मदद करने के लिए, यह पेपर प्रासंगिक विशेषज्ञता वाले डॉक्टर के लिए एक रोगी की स्वचालित जोड़ी को सक्षम करने के लिए डॉक्टर की सिफारिश के एक उपन्यास कार्य का अध्ययन करता है। जबकि सिफारिश में अधिकांश पूर्व कार्य अपने पिछले व्यवहार से लक्ष्य उपयोगकर्ताओं को मॉडलिंग करने पर केंद्रित है, हम केवल गोपनीयता कारणों से रोगी की जरूरतों का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक क्वेरी में सीमित शब्दों पर भरोसा कर सकते हैं। डॉक्टर मॉडलिंग के लिए, हम अन्य रोगियों के साथ उनके प्रोफाइल और पिछले संवादों के संयुक्त प्रभावों का अध्ययन करते हैं और आत्म-सीखने के माध्यम से उनकी बातचीत का पता लगाते हैं। सीखा डॉक्टर एम्बेडिंग को एक बहु-सिर ध्यान तंत्र के साथ एक रोगी क्वेरी को संभालने की उनकी क्षमताओं का अनुमान लगाने के लिए आगे नियोजित किया जाता है। प्रयोगों के लिए, एक बड़े पैमाने पर डेटासेट चुन्यू यिशेंग, एक चीनी ऑनलाइन स्वास्थ्य मंच से एकत्र किया जाता है, जहां हमारा मॉडल अत्याधुनिक परिणामों को प्रदर्शित करता है, बेसलाइन को पछाड़ते हुए केवल एक डॉक्टर को चिह्नित करने के लिए प्रोफाइल और पिछले संवादों पर विचार किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'На онлайн-форумах здравоохранения ежедневно генерируются огромные объемы запросов пациентов, что делает ручное распределение врачей трудоемкой задачей. Чтобы лучше помочь пациентам, в этой статье изучается новая задача рекомендации врача, чтобы обеспечить автоматическое сопряжение пациента с врачом, имеющим соответствующий опыт. В то время как большая часть предыдущей работы в рекомендациях сосредоточена на моделировании целевых пользователей из их прошлого поведения, мы можем полагаться только на ограниченные слова в запросе, чтобы вывести потребности пациента из соображений конфиденциальности. Для моделирования врача мы изучаем совместные эффекты их профилей и предыдущих диалогов с другими пациентами и изучаем их взаимодействия через самообучение. Изученные вложения врача дополнительно используются для оценки их возможностей обработки запроса пациента с помощью механизма многоглавого внимания. Для экспериментов собирается крупномасштабный набор данных от Chunyu Yisheng, китайского онлайн форума здравоохранения, где наша модель демонстрирует самые современные результаты, превосходящие базовые линии, учитывают только профили и прошлые диалоги, чтобы охарактеризовать врача.', 'ga': 'Gintear líon mór fiosrúchán othar gach lá ar fhóraim sláinte ar líne, rud a fhágann gur tasc dian-saothar é leithdháileadh dochtúra láimhe. Chun cabhrú le hothair ar bhealach níos fearr, déanann an páipéar seo staidéar ar thasc nua de mholadh dochtúra chun othar a phéireáil go huathoibríoch chuig dochtúir a bhfuil saineolas ábhartha aige. Cé go ndírítear an chuid is mó den obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar spriocúsáideoirí a shamhaltú óna n-iompar san am atá caite, ní féidir linn brath ach ar na focail theoranta i gceist le tátal a bhaint as riachtanais othair ar chúiseanna príobháideachta. Maidir le samhaltú dochtúra, déanaimid staidéar ar chomhéifeachtaí a bpróifílí agus idirphlé roimhe seo le hothair eile agus iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar a n-idirghníomhaíochtaí trí fhéinfhoghlaim. Tá na leabaithe dochtúra foghlamtha fostaithe a thuilleadh chun meastachán a dhéanamh ar a gcumas déileáil le fiosrúchán othair le meicníocht aird ilcheann. Le haghaidh turgnaimh, bailítear tacar sonraí ar scála mór ó Chunyu Yisheng, fóram sláinte Síneach ar líne, ina dtaispeánann ár múnla na torthaí úrscothacha, ag feidhmiú níos fearr ná na bunlínte ach ní bhreithníonn ach próifílí agus idirphlé san am atá caite mar thréith ag dochtúir.', 'el': 'Τεράστιοι όγκοι ερωτήσεων ασθενών δημιουργούνται καθημερινά σε διαδικτυακά φόρουμ υγείας, καθιστώντας τη χειρωνακτική κατανομή γιατρού εργασία εντατική. Για να βοηθήσει καλύτερα τους ασθενείς, αυτή η εργασία μελετά ένα νέο έργο σύστασης γιατρού για να επιτρέψει την αυτόματη σύζευξη ενός ασθενούς με έναν γιατρό με σχετική εμπειρογνωμοσύνη. Ενώ οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες εργασίες για συστάσεις επικεντρώνονται στη μοντελοποίηση χρηστών στόχων από την προηγούμενη συμπεριφορά τους, μπορούμε να βασιστούμε μόνο στις περιορισμένες λέξεις σε ένα ερώτημα για να συμπεράνουμε τις ανάγκες ενός ασθενούς για λόγους απορρήτου. Για τη μοντελοποίηση γιατρών, μελετάμε τις κοινές επιδράσεις των προφίλ τους και των προηγούμενων διαλόγων τους με άλλους ασθενείς και εξερευνούμε τις αλληλεπιδράσεις τους μέσω αυτομάθησης. Οι μαθημένες ενσωματώσεις γιατρού χρησιμοποιούνται περαιτέρω για να εκτιμήσουν τις ικανότητές τους να χειρίζονται ένα ερώτημα ασθενών με έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής πολλαπλών κεφαλιών. Για πειράματα, ένα σύνολο δεδομένων μεγάλης κλίμακας συλλέγεται από το Chunyu Yisheng, ένα κινεζικό διαδικτυακό φόρουμ υγείας, όπου το μοντέλο μας παρουσιάζει τα τελευταία αποτελέσματα, ξεπερνώντας τις γραμμές βάσης μόνο λαμβάνοντας υπόψη προφίλ και προηγούμενους διαλόγους για να χαρακτηρίσει έναν γιατρό.', 'hu': 'Naponta óriási mennyiségű betegkérdezést generálnak az online egészségügyi fórumokon, így a manuális orvosi elosztás munkaigényes feladatot jelent. A betegek jobb segítése érdekében ez a tanulmány az orvosi ajánlás új feladatát tanulmányozza, amely lehetővé teszi a beteg automatikus párosítását egy releváns szakértelemmel rendelkező orvossal. Míg a legtöbb korábbi ajánlási munka a célfelhasználók múltbeli viselkedésük alapján történő modellezésére összpontosít, csak a lekérdezésben szereplő korlátozott szavakra támaszkodhatunk, hogy adatvédelmi okokból következtessük a beteg igényeit. Az orvosi modellezés céljából tanulmányozzuk profiljuk ízületi hatásait és más betegekkel folytatott korábbi párbeszédeiket, és öntanuláson keresztül vizsgáljuk interakcióikat. A tanult orvosi beágyazásokat továbbá arra használjuk, hogy felmérjük, milyen képességük van egy betegkérdezés kezelésére egy többfejű figyelemmel rendelkező mechanizmussal. A kísérletekhez nagyszabású adatkészletet gyűjtünk a Chunyu Yisheng, egy kínai online egészségügyi fórum, ahol modellünk a legkorszerűbb eredményeket mutatja be, túllépve az alapvető értékeket, csak profilokat és múltbeli párbeszédeket vesz figyelembe az orvos jellemzésére.', 'ka': 'პაციენტის კითხვების დიდი volumes ყოველდღე იქნება ინტერნეტიური ჯანმრთელობის ფორმებში, რომელიც მანძილური ექსტური მოთავსება სამუშაო ინტერნეტიური რომ უკეთესი დახმარება პოციენტებისთვის, ეს დოკუმენტი აკეთებს პრომენტის მოწყობილობას, რომ ავტომატური პოციენტის დაკავშირება შესაძლებლობად შესაძლებელი მაგრამ უფრო წინ მუშაობაში მუშაობაში მუშაობაში მოდელური მომხმარებელი მომხმარებისთვის მოდელურებაზე, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია მხოლოდ პირადი სიტყვებისთვის დარწმუნოთ დიქტორის მოდელეციისთვის, ჩვენ ისინი პროფილის და წინა დიალოგიების ერთადერთი ეფექტების შესახებ ვისწავლობთ და ისინი ინტერფექციას თავისწავლებით გამოყენებთ სწავლილი ექსტრუმენტის შესახებ უფრო მეტად მომხმარებულია, რომ მათი შესაძლებლობა პაციენტის შესახებ მრავალთან მექსინემისთვის შესახებ. ექსპერიმენტებისთვის დიდი მანქანის მონაცემები Chunyu Yisheng-დან, ჩინეთი ინტერნეტიური ჯანმრთელი ფორმიდან, სადაც ჩვენი მოდელი გამოჩვენებს წარმოდგენების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგების შედეგები', 'it': "Enormi volumi di domande dei pazienti vengono generati quotidianamente sui forum sanitari online, rendendo l'assegnazione manuale del medico un compito ad alta intensità di lavoro. Per aiutare meglio i pazienti, questo articolo studia un nuovo compito di raccomandazione del medico per consentire l'accoppiamento automatico di un paziente con un medico con competenze rilevanti. Mentre la maggior parte dei lavori precedenti nella raccomandazione si concentra sulla modellazione degli utenti target dal loro comportamento passato, possiamo fare affidamento solo sulle parole limitate di una query per dedurre le esigenze di un paziente per motivi di privacy. Per la modellazione del medico, studiamo gli effetti articolari dei loro profili e precedenti dialoghi con altri pazienti ed esploriamo le loro interazioni attraverso l'auto-apprendimento. Gli insiemi medici appresi sono ulteriormente impiegati per stimare le loro capacità di gestire una query del paziente con un meccanismo di attenzione multi-testa. Per gli esperimenti, un set di dati su larga scala viene raccolto da Chunyu Yisheng, un forum cinese sulla salute online, dove il nostro modello mostra i risultati all'avanguardia, superando le linee di base considerano solo profili e dialoghi passati per caratterizzare un medico.", 'lt': 'Didelis pacientų klausimų skaičius kasdien susidaro internetiniuose sveikatos forumuose, todėl rankinis gydytojas skiria daug darbo. Siekiant geriau padėti pacientams, šiame dokumente tiriamas naujas gydytojo rekomendacijos uždavinys, kad pacientas būtų automatiškai parenkamas su atitinkama patirtimi turinčiu gydytoju. Nors dauguma ankstesnių rekomendacijų atliktų darbų daugiausia dėmesio skiria tikslinių vartotojų modeliavimui pagal jų ankstesnį elgesį, mes galime pasikliauti tik ribotais žodžiais užklausoje, kad būtų galima nustatyti paciento poreikius dėl privatumo prieža s čių. Gydytojų modeliavimui mes tiriame jų profilių sąnarių poveikį ir ankstesnius dialogus su kitais pacientais ir tiriame jų sąveiką pasitelkiant savarankišką mokymąsi. Išmokytų gydytojų įdėjiniai toliau naudojami vertinant jų gebėjimus tvarkyti paciento klausimą daugiapakopiu dėmesio mechanizmu. Eksperimentams iš Kinijos internetinio sveikatos forumo Chunyu Yisheng renkamas didelio masto duomenų rinkinys, kuriame mūsų model is parodo naujausius rezultatus, viršijančius bazinius rodiklius atsižvelgiama tik į profilius ir ankstesnius dialogus gydytojui apibūdinti.', 'mk': 'Голем број прашања за пациентите се генерирани секојдневно на онлајн здравствени форуми, со што рачниот доктор ја приложува работната интензивна задача. За подобра помош на пациентите, овој весник проучува нова задача на докторска препорака за овозможување автоматско парирање на пациентот со доктор со релевантна експертиза. И покрај тоа што повеќето претходни работи во препораките се фокусираат на моделирање на корисниците на метата од нивното минато однесување, ние можеме само да се потпираме на ограничените зборови во прашањето за да се заклучат потребите на пациентот од причини за приватност. За докторското моделирање, ги проучуваме заедничките ефекти на нивните профили и претходните дијалози со други пациенти и ги истражуваме нивните интеракции преку самоучење. Научените докторски механизми се понатаму употребени за проценка на нивните способности да се справат со прашањето на пациентот со механизам на повеќето глави внимание. За експериментите се собираат големи податоци од Чуниу Јишенг, кинески онлајн форум за здравство, каде нашиот модел ги покажува најсовремените резултати, надминувајќи ги базите линии само разгледуваат профили и минати дијалози за да се карактеризира доктор.', 'kk': 'Пациенттің сұрақтарының күнделік күнделігі онлайн саулық форумында құрылады. Қолмен дәрігер жұмыс-тең тапсырманы қолданып береді. Пациенттерді жақсы көмектесу үшін, бұл қағаз дәрігерінің жаңа тапсырмасын оқу үшін пациентті автоматты түрде біріктіруге болатын дәрігеріне қатынасыз көмектесетін жа Алдыңғы жұмыс мақсатты пайдаланушыларды өткен тәртібінен моделдеу үшін, біз тек пациенттің жеке тәртіпсіздік себептері үшін сұрақтардың шектелген сөздеріне көмектесе аламыз. Дәрігер моделі үшін біз өз оқыту арқылы өзінің профильдерінің жалпы эффекттерін және алдыңғы диалогтарының біріктіріп, өзінің оқыту арқылы өзінің әріптерін Оқылған дәрігер ендіру көпшілікті механизммен пациенттің сұрақтарын басқару мүмкіндігін бағалау үшін қолданылады. Тәжірибелер үшін үлкен масштаб деректер жинағы Чуну Йишенген, қытайша онлайн саулық форумынан жинақталады. Біздің моделіміз дәрігерін таңдау үшін тек профильдерді және өткен диалогтарды көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Volum besar pertanyaan pesakit dihasilkan sehari-hari pada forum kesehatan online, menjadikan alokasi doktor manual tugas yang intensiv kerja. To better help patients, this paper studies a novel task of doctor recommendation to enable automatic pairing of a patient to a doctor with relevant expertise.  Sementara kebanyakan kerja terdahulu dalam rekomendasi fokus pada modelkan pengguna sasaran dari perilaku masa lalu mereka, kita hanya boleh bergantung pada kata-kata yang terbatas dalam pertanyaan untuk menyimpulkan keperluan pesakit untuk alasan privasi. Untuk model doktor, kami mempelajari kesan kongsi profil mereka dan dialog sebelumnya dengan pesakit lain dan mengeksplorasi interaksi mereka melalui belajar diri. Pencampuran doktor yang belajar lebih lanjut digunakan untuk menghargai kemampuan mereka untuk mengendalikan pertanyaan pesakit dengan mekanisme perhatian berbilang-kepala. Untuk eksperimen, set data skala besar dikumpulkan dari Chunyu Yisheng, forum kesehatan online Cina, di mana model kami menunjukkan keputusan state-of-the-art, melampaui garis dasar hanya mempertimbangkan profil dan dialog masa lalu untuk menguntungkan doktor.', 'ml': 'രോഗികളുടെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ദിവസവും ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ആരോഗ്യത്തിന്റെ ഫോര്\u200dമുകളില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കൈകാര്യം ഡോക്ടര്\u200d ജോലി  രോഗികളെ നല്ല സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ഡോക്ടര്\u200d പരിശോധനയുടെ ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു രോഗിയുടെ സ്വയമായി ജോട്ടിയാ പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മുന്\u200dപ് ജോലി ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d അവയുടെ സ്വകാര്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം ഉപയോക്താക്കളെ മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് ശ്രദ്ധി ഡോക്ടര്\u200d മോഡേലിങ്ങിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d അവരുടെ പ്രൊഫൈലുകളുടെ സഹപ്രഭാവങ്ങളും മുമ്പ് രോഗികളുടെ സംഭാഷണങ്ങളും പഠിക്കുകയ പഠിച്ച ഡോക്ടര്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് വരുന്നത് ഒരു രോഗിയുടെ ചോദ്യം കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാനുള്ള കഴിവുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നു പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഒരു വലിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ചൈനീസ് ഓണ്\u200dലെഷ്യല്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമില്\u200d നിന്നും ചൈനീസ് യിഷെങ്ങില്\u200d നിന്നും, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു ഡോക്ടര്\u200d സ്റ്റേ', 'mt': 'Volumi kbar ta’ mistoqsijiet tal-pazjenti jiġu ġġenerati kuljum f’fora tas-saħħa onlajn, u l-allokazzjoni manwali tat-tabib issir kompitu intensiv fix-xogħol. Biex jgħin a ħjar lill-pazjenti, dan id-dokument jistudja kompitu ġdid ta’ rakkomandazzjoni tat-tabib biex jippermetti l-paragun awtomatiku ta’ pazjent ma’ tabib b’kompetenza rilevanti. Filwaqt li l-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol preċedenti fir-rakkomandazzjoni jiffoka fuq l-immudellar tal-utenti fil-mira mill-imġiba tal-imgħoddi tagħhom, nistgħu niddependi biss fuq il-kliem limitat f’mistoqsija biex jiġu konklużi l-ħtiġijiet ta’ pazjent għal raġunijiet ta’ privatezza. Għall-mudell tat-tabib, nistudjaw l-effetti tal-ġogi tal-profili tagħhom u d-djalogi preċedenti ma’ pazjenti oħra u nistudjaw l-interazzjonijiet tagħhom permezz tat-tagħlim awtonomu. L-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-tabib imgħallem qed jintużaw aktar biex jistmaw il-kapaċitajiet tagħhom li jimmaniġġjaw mistoqsija tal-pazjent b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni b’ħafna ras. Għall-esperimenti, jinġabar sett ta’ dejta fuq skala kbira minn Chunyu Yisheng, forum tas-saħħa onlajn Ċiniż, fejn il-mudell tagħna juri r-riżultati l-aktar avvanzati, li jaqbeż il-linji bażi jikkunsidraw biss profili u djalogi tal-passat biex jikkaratterizzaw tabib.', 'pl': 'Ogromne ilości zapytań pacjentów generowane są codziennie na internetowych forach zdrowia, co sprawia, że ręczna alokacja lekarzy jest zadaniem pracochłonnym. Aby lepiej pomóc pacjentom, niniejszy artykuł bada nowe zadanie rekomendacji lekarza umożliwiające automatyczne połączenie pacjenta z lekarzem posiadającym odpowiednią wiedzę fachową. Podczas gdy większość wcześniejszych prac w zakresie rekomendacji skupia się na modelowaniu docelowych użytkowników z ich wcześniejszego zachowania, możemy polegać tylko na ograniczonych słowach w zapytaniu, aby wnioskować potrzeby pacjenta ze względów prywatności. Do modelowania lekarzy badamy wspólne efekty ich profili i poprzednich dialogów z innymi pacjentami oraz badamy ich interakcje poprzez samouczenie się. Nauczone osadzenia lekarza są dalej wykorzystywane do oszacowania ich możliwości obsługi zapytania pacjenta za pomocą mechanizmu uwagi wielu głów. Do eksperymentów zbiór danych na dużą skalę gromadzony jest z Chunyu Yisheng, chińskiego internetowego forum zdrowia, gdzie nasz model wykazuje najnowocześniejsze wyniki, przewyższając linie bazowe uwzględniają tylko profile i wcześniejsze dialogi w celu charakteryzowania lekarza.', 'mn': 'Өвчтөн эрүүл мэндийн форум дээр өдөр тутмын их хэмжээний асуулт үүсгэдэг. Эмч хүмүүс гарын эмч ажлын хүчтэй ажлыг рэндэрлэдэг. Өвчтөн туслахын тулд энэ цаас эмч нарын тусламжтай эмч дээр автоматаар холбогдох зөвлөгөөний шинэ ажил судалдаг. Өмнөх үйл явцаас илүү өмнөх зөвхөн зорилготой хэрэглэгчдийг загварчлахад анхаарлаа хандуулж байгаа ч өвчтөний хэрэгцээг хувийн шалтгаанаас тусалж чадна. Эмч загварын төлөө бид өөрсдийн профиль болон өмнөх өвчтөнүүдтэй хамтран ярилцлагын холбоотой нөлөөг судалж, өөрсдийн сургалтын аргаар харилцааныг судалж байна. Сургуулсан эмч нэмж нь өвчтөн дээрх олон толгой анхаарал төвлөрүүлэх механизмтай ажилладаг. туршилтуудын тулд Хятад онлайн эрүүл мэндийн форум Чуну Ишенгээс том хэмжээний өгөгдлийн сангууд цуглуулагддаг. Бидний загвар нь эмч болон өмнөх диалогуудыг харуулахын тулд илэрхийлэгддэг.', 'ro': 'Volumuri uriașe de interogări ale pacienților sunt generate zilnic pe forumurile online de sănătate, ceea ce face alocarea manuală a medicului o sarcină intensivă de muncă. Pentru a ajuta mai bine pacienții, această lucrare studiază o sarcină nouă de recomandare a medicului pentru a permite asocierea automată a unui pacient cu un medic cu expertiză relevantă. În timp ce majoritatea lucrărilor anterioare în recomandare se concentrează pe modelarea utilizatorilor țintă din comportamentul lor anterior, ne putem baza doar pe cuvintele limitate dintr-o interogare pentru a deduce nevoile unui pacient din motive de confidențialitate. Pentru modelarea medicului, studiem efectele articulare ale profilurilor lor și dialogurile anterioare cu alți pacienți și explorăm interacțiunile lor prin auto-învățare. Încorporările medicilor învățați sunt utilizate în continuare pentru a estima capacitățile lor de a gestiona o interogare a pacientului cu un mecanism de atenție multi-cap. Pentru experimente, un set de date la scară largă este colectat de la Chunyu Yisheng, un forum chinez online de sănătate, unde modelul nostru prezintă rezultate de ultimă oră, depășind liniile de bază luând în considerare doar profilurile și dialogurile anterioare pentru a caracteriza un medic.', 'no': 'Stor volum av pasientespørsmål er daglig generert på online helseforum, og gjer manuelt lege tildelt ei arbeidintensivt oppgåve. For å ha bedre hjelp til pasienter, studerer denne papiret eit nytt oppgåve av legerekomendering for å slå på automatisk pare av ein pasient til ein lege med relevante ekspertisering. Mens det meste førre arbeidet i anbefaling fokuserer på modellering av målbrukarar frå sine siste oppførsel, kan vi berre rely på dei begrensede ord i eit spørjing for å oppgje behov på ein pasient for privat grunn. For læring av lege, studerer vi felles effektar av profilene sine og førre dialogvindauge med andre pasienter og utforsk interaksjonen sine via selvlæring. Den lærte innbygginga av doktoren er meir arbeida for å vurdere at dei kan handtera ein pasientspørjing med ein fleire hovudmerksmekanisme. For eksperimenter vert eit stor dataset samla frå Chunyu Yisheng, eit kinesisk helseforum på nettverket, der modellen vårt viser kunstendige resultatet, som ikkje utfører baselinjer berre ser på profilar og siste dialogar for å karakterisera ein lege.', 'so': 'Wararka caafimaadka ee bukaanka waxaa maalin walba laga sameynayaa iskuullada internetka, waxaana laga sameynayaa goobta dhakhtarka dhakhtarka ee qofka dhakhtarka ah oo shaqada ku shaqeeya. To better help patients, this paper studies a novel task of doctor recommendation to enable automatic pairing of a patient to a doctor with relevant expertise.  Inta badan ka horeysa shaqada arimaha la talinayo waxay ku kalsoonaan karaan tusaale ahaan isticmaalayaasha caafimaadkooda hore, waxaynu ku kalsoonaan karnaa hadalka xadgudban si aan u fekerno baahida bukaanka sababaha gaarka ah darteed. Tusaale ahaan dhakhtarka ayaannu u baranaynaa saameyaasha wadajirka ah ee borofaylka iyo hadallada hore oo la xiriira bukaanka kale, waxaana baaraynaa xiriirkooda xagga iskuulka. Dhakhtarka waxbarashadu waxey sidoo kale u isticmaalaan in ay qiimeeyaan awoodooda ay sameyn karto su’aalka bukaanka oo ay leeyihiin meymisyo aad u fiirsan karto. Imtixaanka waxaa laga soo ururiyaa kooras macluumaad aad u weyn Chunyu Yisheng, kaas oo ah jaamacadda caafimaadka ee Shiino, kaas oo modellkayagu ku muujiyaa arimaha rasmiga farshaxanka, bandhigyada aasaasiga ah oo keliya ka fiirsada borofaylka iyo diyaariyada hore si uu dhakhtarka u gaaro.', 'sv': 'Stora volymer av patientfrågor genereras dagligen på hälsoforum online, vilket gör manuell läkartilldelning till en arbetsintensiv uppgift. För att bättre hjälpa patienter studerar denna uppsats en ny uppgift med läkarrekommendation för att möjliggöra automatisk parkoppling av en patient till en läkare med relevant kompetens. Medan de flesta tidigare rekommendationsarbeten fokuserar på att modellera målgrupper utifrån deras tidigare beteende, kan vi bara förlita oss på de begränsade orden i en fråga för att härleda patientens behov av sekretessskäl. För läkarmodellering studerar vi ledeffekterna av deras profiler och tidigare dialoger med andra patienter och utforskar deras interaktioner via självlärande. De lärda läkarinbäddningarna används vidare för att uppskatta deras förmåga att hantera en patientfråga med en flerskalig uppmärksamhetsmekanism. För experiment samlas en storskalig datamängd in från Chunyu Yisheng, ett kinesiskt hälsoforum online, där vår modell visar de senaste resultaten, överträffar baslinjerna endast profiler och tidigare dialoger för att karakterisera en läkare.', 'sr': 'Ogromni volumi ispitivanja pacijenata svakodnevno se proizvode na internetskim zdravstvenim forumima, koji donose rukovne doktorske raspodjele radnom intenzivnom zadatku. Da bi bolje pomoglo pacijentima, ovaj papir ispitiva nov zadatak preporuke doktora kako bi omogućio automatsku paru pacijenta doktoru s relevantnim stručnostima. Iako je većin a prethodnog rada u preporukama fokusirana na modeliranje meta korisnika iz njihovog prošlog ponašanja, možemo se osloniti na ograničene reči u pitanju da uvodimo potrebe pacijenta iz razloga privatnosti. Za modeliranje doktora, proučavamo zajedničke efekte njihovih profila i prethodnih dijaloga s drugim pacijentima i istražujemo njihove interakcije putem samouučenja. Nauèeni doktori su dalje zaposleni kako bi procenili svoje moguænosti da se bave pitanjem pacijenata sa višeglavnim pažnjom mehanizma. Za eksperimente, velika skupina podataka se okuplja iz Čunija Yisheng, kineskog internetskog zdravstvenog forum a, gde naš model pokazuje rezultate stanja umjetnosti, izvršene osnovne linije razmatraju samo profile i prošle dijaloge da bi karakterizirali doktora.', 'ur': 'بیماروں کی بہت بڑی آوازوں روزہ آنلاین سلامتی فورموں میں پیدا کیے جاتے ہیں، مصنوعی ڈاکٹر کے ذریعہ ایک کام کے مطابق اضافہ کرتا ہے. بیماروں کو اچھی مدد کرنے کے لئے، یہ کاغذ ڈاکٹر کی تعلیم کے نو کام کی تلاش کرتا ہے کہ ایک بیمار کے ساتھ اپنا دوسرا جوڑ کرنا اچھی تعلیم دے سکے۔ اگرچہ ان کے اگلے رفتار سے موجود کاروں کو موجود کرنے پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے، ہم صرف ایک مریض کی ضرورت خصوصی دلیلوں کے لئے محدودہ کلمات پر اعتماد کر سکتے ہیں۔ ڈاکٹر نمڈلینگ کے لئے، ہم ان کے پروفائل اور پہلے درجے کے مشترک اثرات کو پڑھتے ہیں اور ان کے اثرات کو اپنے سیکھنے کے ذریعے اثرات کے ذریعہ تحقیق کرتے ہیں. سکھایا گیا ڈاکٹر ایمبڈینگ اس سے زیادہ استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں کہ ایک بیمار کی سؤال کے مطابق ایک متعدد سر کی توجه مکانیزی کے ساتھ مطابق کریں۔ آزمائش کے لئے، ایک بڑی اسکیل ڈاٹ سٹ Chunyu Yisheng سے جمع کیا جاتا ہے، ایک چینی آنلاین سلامتی فورمن، جہاں ہماری مدل ایک ڈاکٹر کو دکھاتا ہے، بنسٹ لینوں کو صرف پروفائل اور اگلے ڈاکٹر کو دکھانے کے لئے سمجھتے ہیں.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හැමදාම අන්තර්ජාත්මක විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්න රෝගිකයන්ට හොඳට උදව් කරන්න, මේ පැත්තේ වෛද්\u200dයයෙක් ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත වි ඔවුන්ගේ අවස්ථාවයෙන් ඉලක්කම් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා, අපිට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් ප ඩොක්ටර් මෝඩල් එක්ක, අපි ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරොෆිල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සහ අනිත් රෝගියෝ එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කත ඉගෙන ගත්ත ඩොක්ටර් ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග්ස් විශේෂයක් විතරයි ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනුමාණය කරන්න ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්න පරීක්ෂණාවට, ලොකු ස්කේල් දත්ත සැට් Chuyu Yisheng, චීනි අන්ලයින් ස්වාස්ත්වය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක්, අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය කර', 'ta': 'நோயாளிகள் கேள்விகளின் பெரிய தொகுதிகள் தொடர்ந்து தொடர்ந்த உடல் நலம் குறிப்புகளில் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, கைமுறை மருத சிறந்த நோயாளிகளுக்கு உதவ, இந்த தாள் ஒரு புதிய செயலை மருத்துவர் பரிந்துரைக்கும் பரிந்துரையின் செயல்படுத்துகிறது, தேவைப பரிந்துரைக்கும் பெரும்பாலான வேலை அவர்களுடைய கடந்த நடத்தையில் இருந்து இலக்கு பயனர்களை மாதிரிக்கும் போது, நாம் ஒரு கேள்வியில் மட்டும் ச மருத்துவர் மாதிரிக்க, நாம் அவர்களுடைய குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் முந்தைய உரையாடல்களுடன் இணைய விளைவுகளை கற்று மற்றும் அவர்களுடை கற்ற மருத்துவர்கள் உள்ளிடுகின்றனர் மேலும் வேலை செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளார்கள் ஒரு நோயாளியின் கேள்வி கையாளும் அவர்களுடைய சக்த பரிசோதனைகளுக்கு, சீனா யிஷெங்கில் இருந்து ஒரு பெரிய அளவு தகவல் அமைப்பு சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, எங்கள் மாதிரி கலை முடிவுகளை காட்டுகிறது, வெளியேற்றும் அடிப்படைகள் ஒரு மருத்து', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik soʻrovlarining katta qismi har kuni online saqlash forumlarida yaratiladi, qoʻlbola doktor qoʻllanmalarni ishlab-intensive vazifa qiladi. Bu qoʻllar qo'shilga yordam berishi uchun, bu qoʻllar doktor'ning vazifani avtomatik ikkita qo'shish qo'shilga qo'shish uchun bog'liq taʼminlovchiga ega bo'ladi. Ko'pchilik talab qilayotganda, oldingi tablardan foydalanuvchilarga foydalanuvchilarga foydalanuvchilarga foydalanishimizni foydalanishimiz mumkin, biz faqat qo'shimcha so'zlarni qo'shish uchun qo'shimcha so'zlariga ishlatamiz mumkin. Doktor modeli uchun biz profillari va oldingi muloqatlar bilan birlashtirish natijalarini o'rganamiz va boshqa qo'llangan muloqat bilan boshqa muloqatlarni o'rganimiz va ularning interfektlarini o'rganish orqali o'rganish uchun O'rganilgan doktorlar bir necha boshqaruvchi tizim bilan qo'shish qobiliyatlarini bajarishga ishlaydi. For experiments, a large-scale dataset is collected from Chunyu Yisheng, a Chinese online health forum, where our model exhibits the state-of-the-art results, outperforming baselines only consider profiles and past dialogues to characterize a doctor.", 'vi': 'Số lượng lớn các câu hỏi của bệnh nhân được tạo ra hàng ngày trên các diễn đàn sức khỏe trực tuyến, khiến bác sĩ trực tiếp phân công lao động. Để giúp bệnh nhân tốt hơn, tờ giấy này nghiên cứu một nhiệm vụ mới của tiến sĩ tiến cử để cho phép kết hợp tự động của bệnh nhân với bác sĩ có chuyên môn. Trong khi phần lớn công việc trước trong giới thiệu tập trung vào việc người dùng mẫu từ hành vi quá khứ của họ, chúng ta chỉ có thể dựa vào những từ giới hạn trong một câu hỏi để nhận ra nhu cầu của bệnh nhân vì lý do riêng tư. Để làm mẫu cho bác sĩ, chúng tôi nghiên cứu kết quả khớp của hồ sơ và các cuộc đối thoại trước với các bệnh nhân khác và khám phá tương tác của họ qua tự học. Những tiến sĩ đã học thêm được tuyển dụng để đánh giá khả năng xử lý một câu hỏi bệnh nhân với một cơ chế tập trung nhiều đầu. Đối với thí nghiệm, một bộ dữ liệu quy mô lớn được thu thập từ Chuku Yisheng, một diễn đàn sức khỏe trực tuyến Trung Quốc, nơi mẫu của chúng tôi trưng bày kết quả hiện đại nghệ thuật, những nền văn bản sơ suất chỉ xem hồ sơ và các ca thoại quá khứ để diễn tả một bác sĩ.', 'nl': 'Dagelijks worden enorme hoeveelheden patiëntvragen gegenereerd op online gezondheidsfora, waardoor handmatige toewijzing van artsen een arbeidsintensieve taak wordt. Om patiënten beter te helpen, bestudeert deze paper een nieuwe taak van doktersaanbeveling om automatische koppeling van een patiënt met een arts met relevante expertise mogelijk te maken. Hoewel het meeste eerdere werk in aanbeveling zich richt op het modelleren van doelgroepen op basis van hun gedrag in het verleden, kunnen we alleen vertrouwen op de beperkte woorden in een query om de behoeften van een patiënt om privacyredenen af te leiden. Voor doktersmodellering bestuderen we de gezamenlijke effecten van hun profielen en eerdere dialogen met andere patiënten en onderzoeken we hun interacties via zelfleren. De geleerde doktersinbeddingen worden verder gebruikt om hun mogelijkheden in te schatten om een patiëntvraag te behandelen met een multi-head attention mechanisme. Voor experimenten wordt een grootschalige dataset verzameld van Chunyu Yisheng, een Chinees online gezondheidsforum, waar ons model de state-of-the-art resultaten toont, waarbij baselines alleen rekening houden met profielen en dialogen uit het verleden om een arts te karakteriseren.', 'bg': 'Огромни обеми от запитвания за пациенти ежедневно се генерират на онлайн здравни форуми, което превръща ръчното разпределение на лекарите в трудоемка задача. За да се помогне по-добре на пациентите, тази статия изследва нова задача на лекарска препоръка, за да се даде възможност за автоматично свързване на пациент с лекар със съответния експертен опит. Докато по-голямата част от предишната работа по препоръки се фокусира върху моделирането на целевите потребители от миналото им поведение, можем да разчитаме само на ограничените думи в заявката, за да заключим нуждите на пациента поради причини за поверителност. За моделиране на лекарите изучаваме съвместните ефекти на профилите им и предишните диалози с други пациенти и изследваме взаимодействията им чрез самообучение. Научените докторски вграждания се използват допълнително, за да се оценят способностите им за справяне с заявка на пациента с механизъм за многоглаво внимание. За експерименти се събира мащабен набор от данни от китайски онлайн здравен форум, където нашият модел показва най-съвременните резултати, надминавайки базовите линии, отчитайки само профилите и миналите диалози, за да характеризира лекар.', 'hr': 'Ogromne količine ispitivanja pacijenata svakodnevno se proizvode na internetskim zdravstvenim forumima, koji donose ručni liječnik sadržavanje radnog intenzivnog zadatka. Za bolju pomoć bolesnicima, ovaj papir ispitiva nov zadatak preporuke liječnika kako bi se omogućio automatsko parenje bolesnika liječniku s relevantnim stručnostima. Iako je većin a prethodnog rada u preporuki usredotočena na modeliranje ciljnih korisnika iz njihovog prošlog ponašanja, možemo se oslanjati na ograničene riječi u zahtjevi da uvjerimo potrebe pacijenta iz razloga privatnosti. Za modeliranje liječnika proučavamo zajedničke učinke njihovih profila i prethodnih dijaloga s drugim bolesnicima i istražujemo njihove interakcije putem samouučenja. Učiti liječnici su dalje zaposleni kako bi procijenili svoju mogućnost rješavanja ispitivanja pacijenata s višeglavnim mehanizam pažnje. Za eksperimente, skupljena je velika skupina podataka iz Chunyu Yisheng, kineskog internetskog zdravstvenog forum a, gdje naš model pokazuje rezultate stanja umjetnosti, koji su iznosi osnovne linije samo razmatraju profile i prošle dijaloge kako bi se karakterizirali liječnika.', 'da': 'Store mængder af patientforespørgsler genereres dagligt på online sundhedsfora, hvilket gør manuel lægeallokering til en arbejdskraftintensiv opgave. For bedre at hjælpe patienterne undersøger dette dokument en ny opgave med lægeanbefaling for at muliggøre automatisk parring af en patient med en læge med relevant ekspertise. Mens det meste tidligere arbejde i anbefalinger fokuserer på at modellere målbrugere ud fra deres tidligere adfærd, kan vi kun stole på de begrænsede ord i en forespørgsel for at udlede en patients behov af privatlivsgrunde. Til lægemodellering undersøger vi fælleseffekterne af deres profiler og tidligere dialoger med andre patienter og undersøger deres interaktioner via selvlæring. De lærte lægeindlejringer anvendes yderligere til at estimere deres evner til at håndtere en patientforespørgsel med en opmærksomhedsmekanisme med flere hoveder. Til eksperimenter indsamles et storstilet datasæt fra Chunyu Yisheng, et kinesisk online sundhedsforum, hvor vores model udstiller de nyeste resultater, overgår baselines kun profiler og tidligere dialoger til at karakterisere en læge.', 'de': 'Täglich werden riesige Mengen an Patientenabfragen in Online-Gesundheitsforen generiert, was die manuelle Zuweisung von Ärzten zu einer arbeitsintensiven Aufgabe macht. Um Patienten besser zu helfen, untersucht dieser Beitrag eine neuartige Aufgabe der ärztlichen Empfehlung, um eine automatische Paarung eines Patienten mit einem Arzt mit relevantem Fachwissen zu ermöglichen. Während sich die meisten früheren Empfehlungsarbeiten auf die Modellierung von Zielbenutzern aus ihrem früheren Verhalten konzentrieren, können wir uns nur auf die begrenzten Wörter in einer Abfrage verlassen, um die Bedürfnisse eines Patienten aus Datenschutzgründen abzuleiten. Für die Modellierung von Ärzten untersuchen wir die gemeinsamen Effekte ihrer Profile und bisheriger Dialoge mit anderen Patienten und erforschen deren Interaktionen durch Selbstlernen. Die erlernten Arzt-Einbettungen werden weiter verwendet, um ihre Fähigkeiten zur Handhabung einer Patientenabfrage mit einem Mehrkopf-Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus abzuschätzen. Für Experimente wird ein großer Datensatz von Chunyu Yisheng gesammelt, einem chinesischen Online-Gesundheitsforum, in dem unser Modell die neuesten Ergebnisse zeigt und Baselines übertrifft, die nur Profile und vergangene Dialoge berücksichtigen, um einen Arzt zu charakterisieren.', 'id': 'Jumlah besar pertanyaan pasien dihasilkan sehari-hari di forum kesehatan online, menjadikan alokasi dokter manual tugas yang intensiv pekerjaan. Untuk membantu pasien lebih baik, kertas ini mempelajari tugas baru dari rekomendasi dokter untuk memungkinkan pasangan otomatis pasien ke dokter dengan keahlian relevan. Sementara kebanyakan pekerjaan sebelumnya dalam rekomendasi fokus pada model pengguna sasaran dari perilaku masa lalu mereka, kita hanya bisa bergantung pada kata-kata terbatas dalam pertanyaan untuk menyimpulkan kebutuhan pasien untuk alasan privasi. Untuk model dokter, kami mempelajari efek kongsi dari profil mereka dan dialog sebelumnya dengan pasien lain dan mengeksplorasi interaksi mereka melalui belajar diri. Pemasangan dokter belajar lebih lanjut digunakan untuk memperkirakan kemampuan mereka untuk menangani pertanyaan pasien dengan mekanisme perhatian multi-kepala. Untuk eksperimen, sebuah set data skala besar dikumpulkan dari Chunyu Yisheng, forum kesehatan online Cina, di mana model kami menunjukkan hasil state-of-the-art, melampaui batas dasar hanya mempertimbangkan profil dan dialog masa lalu untuk mengkaraterisasi dokter.', 'ko': '온라인 건강 포럼은 매일 대량의 환자 조회가 발생하여 수동으로 의사를 분배하는 것이 노동집약형 임무가 되었다.환자를 더욱 잘 돕기 위해 본고는 새로운 의사 추천 임무를 연구하여 환자와 관련 전문 지식을 가진 의사의 자동 배합을 실현하고자 한다.이전의 대다수 추천 업무는 목표 사용자의 과거 행위에 따라 모델링하는 데 중심을 두었지만 우리는 조회 중의 유한한 단어에 의존하여 환자가 프라이버시 원인에 대한 수요를 추정할 수 밖에 없다.의사 모델링에 대해 우리는 그들의 개인 자료와 이전에 다른 환자와의 대화의 연합된 영향을 연구하고 자기 학습을 통해 그들의 상호작용을 탐색한다.배운 의사의 삽입은 다중 주의 메커니즘을 통해 환자의 조회를 처리하는 능력을 평가하는 데 더욱 사용된다.실험을 진행하기 위해 우리는 중국 온라인 건강 포럼 춘우익생(Chunyu Yisheng)에서 대규모 데이터 집합을 수집했다. 우리의 모델은 가장 선진적인 결과를 보여주었고 기준보다 우수하며 의사의 개인 자료와 과거의 대화를 묘사하는 것만 고려했다.', 'fa': 'مجموعه\u200cهای بزرگ از سوال بیماران روزی در مجموعه\u200cهای سلامتی آنلاین تولید می\u200cشوند، که دکتر دستی را به یک کار افزایش می\u200cدهد. برای بهتر کمک به بیماران، این کاغذ یک وظیفه جدید از پیشنهاد دکتر را مطالعه می\u200cکند تا جفت بیمار خود را به یک دکتر با متخصص مربوط به توان دهد. در حالی که بیشتر کارهای پیشینیان در پیشنهاد روی نمونه\u200cسازی کاربران هدف از رفتار گذشته\u200cشان تمرکز می\u200cشود، ما می\u200cتوانیم تنها روی کلمات محدودیت در یک سوال استفاده کنیم تا نیازهای یک بیمار را به دلایل خصوصی آلوده کنیم. برای مدل\u200cسازی دکتر، ما اثرات مشترک پروفایل\u200cهایشان و صحبت\u200cهای قبلی را با بیماران دیگر مطالعه می\u200cکنیم و توسعه\u200cهایشان را از طریق خودآموزش تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. دکتر دانش آموزش بیشتری برای ارزیابی توانایی\u200cهایشان در کنترل سوال بیماری با یک مکانیسم توجه بسیاری از سرها استخدام می\u200cشود. برای آزمایشات، یک مجموعه اطلاعات بسیار بزرگ از چونیو یشینگ، یک فرموم سلامت آنلاین چینی جمع می شود، جایی که مدل ما نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنر را نمایش می\u200cدهد، پایگاه\u200cهای پایین\u200cها را جز پروفایل\u200cها و گفتگوهای گذشته برای ویژه\u200cهای یک دکتر مشخص می\u200c', 'sw': 'Huge volumes of patient queries are daily generated on online health forums, rendering manual doctor allocation a labor-intensive task.  Ili kuwasaidia wagonjwa bora, gazeti hili linasoma jukumu la kitabibu la mapendekezo ya daktari ili kuwawezesha mgonjwa wake wawili binafsi kwa daktari mwenye utaalam wa kisiasa. Wakati shughuli nyingi za kabla katika mapendekezo yanalenga kuwafanya watumiaji wa lengo kutoka tabia zao zilizopita, tunaweza tu kutegemea maneno mipaka katika swali ili kupunguza mahitaji ya mgonjwa kwa sababu za faragha. Kwa mfano wa daktari, tunasoma madhara ya pamoja ya profile zao na mazungumzo yaliyopita na wagonjwa wengine na kutambua mahusiano yao kupitia kujifunza. Madaktari huyo aliyejifunza wanatumika zaidi ili kutathmini uwezo wao wa kukabiliana na utafiti wa mgonjwa wa mgonjwa na mfumo wa kusikiliza vichwa vingi. Kwa majaribio, seti kubwa ya taarifa zinakusanywa kutoka Chunyu Yisheng, jukwaa la afya ya mtandaoni la China, ambapo model yetu inaonyesha matokeo ya sanaa, kutengeneza misingi ya msingi yanachukulia tu utambulisho na mazungumzo yaliyopita ili kumsifika daktari.', 'tr': 'Adamlar soraglarynyň köp sanly forumlary online saglygynda döredilýär, lukmanyň elçiliki işi ýok edip görkezmesi üçin guruldy. Hastalara kömek etmek üçin bu häzir lukmanyň täze täbligini alyp, lukmanyň öz-özüni uly ukyplary bilen alyp barmagy maslahat berýär. Maslahatlardan öň köp işiň uly maksady ulananlaryň öňki hereketinden örän maksady görkezmelerine üns berip bileris, sabyryň hususiyeti sebäpleri üçin ýok etmek üçin syýahat s özlerine diňe maslahat berip bileris. Lukman modellendirmek üçin, olaryň profilleriniň we öňki çykyşlary bilen birleşik täsirlerini öwrenýärdik we olaryň öz öwrenmeleri bilen etkileşişlerini keşfedýäris. Öwrenmeli lukman guramlary birnäçe kelläp üns mekanismi bilen sabyt soragyny çözmek üçin ýüze işleýärler. Synaglaryň üçin uly ölçekli maglumat seti Chunyu Yisheng-den, Çinçe internet saglygynyň forumyndan toplanýar. Biziň nusgymyz lukmanyň biri diňe profilleri we geçen dialoglary gowy görkezýär.', 'af': "Groot volume van paciente vrae is dag genereer op onlinese gesondige forume, die hande dokter toelaai van 'n arbeid-intensiewe taak. Om paciente beter te help, studieer hierdie papier 'n nuwe taak van dokter aanbeveling om outomatiese paar van 'n pacient aan 'n dokter met relevante ekspertiseer te aktiveer. Terwyl die mees voorheede werk in aanbeveling fokus op die modellering van die doel gebruikers van hul verlede gedrag, kan on s net op die beperkte woorde in 'n navraag vertrou om 'n pacient se behoeftes vir privateitsrede te verwyder. Vir dokter modellering, ondersoek ons die joint effekte van hul profiele en vorige dialoog met ander pasiënte en ondersoek hulle interaksies deur self-leer. Die geleerde dokter inbêding is verder gebruik om hul moontlikhede te estimateer om 'n pasiënt navraag met 'n multikop aandag mekanisme te behandel. Vir eksperimente is 'n groot skaal datastel versamel van Chunyu Yisheng, 'n Sjinese onlinese gesondsformaat, waar ons model die staat-van-kuns-resultate vertoon, die uitgevoerde basisline slegs beskou profiele en verlede dialoog om 'n dokter te karakteriseer.", 'am': 'ብዙ የሕመምተኞች ውይይቶች በየቀኑ በመስመር የጤና ፈቃድ ፎርማኖቹ ላይ ይዘዋወራሉ፤ የድካም አካባቢ አካባቢ የስራ ተቃውሞ ስራ ያሳርፋል፡፡ ለደካማዎች ለመረዳት፣ ይህች ደብዳቤ የዶኪር ጉዳይ የጦማሪያን ጉዳይ የጦማሪያን ጉዳይ ለደካማዊ እውቀት ባለው ማኅበራዊ ሁኔታ ለሕኪም ማግኘት ያስችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን አስቀድሞ የሚሠራ ጥያቄ፣ የቀድሞው የአካባቢ ሥርዓት የሚደረጉትን ተጠቃሚዎችን በመግለጽ እናስረዳለን፡፡ ለዳኪቃዎች ምሳሌ፣ የፕሮፋይሎቻቸውን እና የቀድሞውን dialog እናስተምረዋለን ከሌሎችም ደካማዎች ጋር ግንኙነታቸውን በራሱ ትምህርት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተማረ ዶኪር የሚወስዱት የደካማ ድምፅ መፍታት በብዙ ራስ አየር ማሰቃየትን ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን ድምፅ መቆጣጠር ነው፡፡ ለፈተናዎች፣ የቻይና የጤና ፈቃድ ፎርማት ከChunyu Yisheng ትልቅ ዳታዎችን የተሰበሰቡ ናቸው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የ-art ውጤቶችን ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Volume të mëdha pyetjesh të pacientëve janë të gjeneruara përditë në forumet e shëndetësisë online, duke bërë përcaktimin manual të mjekut një detyrë intensive në punë. Për të ndihmuar më mirë pacientët, kjo letër studion një detyrë të re të rekomandimit të doktorit për të mundësuar çiftimin automatik të një pacienti me një doktor me ekspertizë të rëndësishme. Ndërsa shumica e punëve të mëparshme në rekomandim përqëndrohet në modelimin e përdoruesve të shënjestrave nga sjellja e tyre e kaluar, ne mund të mbështetemi vetëm në fjalët e kufizuara në një pyetje për të përfshirë nevojat e një pacienti për arsye private. Për modelimin e mjekut, ne studiojmë efektet e përbashkëta të profileve të tyre dhe dialogeve të mëparshme me pacientë të tjerë dhe eksplorojmë ndërveprimet e tyre nëpërmjet vetëmësimit. Mbledhjet e mjekut të mësuar janë të përdorura më tej për të vlerësuar aftësitë e tyre për trajtimin e një pyetjeje të pacientit me një mekanizëm shumë kokash vëmendje. Për eksperimente, një grup të dhënash në shkallë të madhe është mbledhur nga Chunyu Yisheng, një forum shëndetësor në internet kinez, ku modeli ynë ekspozon rezultatet më të mëdha, duke kaluar linjat bazë vetëm konsiderojnë profile dhe dialoge të kaluara për të karakterizuar një mjek.', 'hy': 'Հիվանդների հարցերի մեծ ծավալները ամեն օր ստեղծվում են առցանց առողջապահության ֆորմում, դարձնելով բժիշկի ձեռավարական բաժանման աշխատանքի ինտենսիվ խնդիր: Ավելի լավ օգնելու համար հիվանդներին, այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է բժիշկի խորհուրդ տալու նոր խնդիր, որպեսզի հնարավոր լինի հիվանդի ավտոմատիկ զույգ առնել բժիշկի հետ, որն ունի ն Մինչդեռ նախորդ խորհուրդների մեծ մասը կենտրոնանում է նպատակային օգտագործողների մոդելավորման վրա իրենց անցյալ վարքագծից, մենք կարող ենք միայն հույս դնել սահմանափակ բառերին հարցում, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք հիվանդի կարիքները ան Բժիշկների մոդելներ կատարելու համար մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նրանց պրոֆիլների և նախկին հաղորդակցվող խոսակցությունների ազդեցությունները և ուսումնասիրում ենք նրանց փոխազդեցությունները ինքնասովորելու միջոցով: Սովորված բժիշկների ներդրումները ավելի շատ օգտագործվում են հաշվարկելու հիվանդի հարցում կառավարելու հնարավորությունները բազմագլխավոր ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով: Փորձերի համար մեծ տվյալների համակարգը հավաքվում է Չունյու Յիսնգում, Չինաստանի առողջապահության առցանց ֆորմում, որտեղ մեր մոդելը ցույց է տալիս ամենահետաքրքիր արդյունքները, որոնք գերազանցում են հիմքային գծերը, միայն հաշվի առնում են բժիշկի բժիշկների բ', 'bs': 'Ogromni volumi ispitivanja pacijenata svakodnevno se proizvode na internetskim zdravstvenim forumima, koji donose ručni liječnik dodavanje radnog intenzivnog zadatka. Da bi bolje pomogla pacijentima, ovaj papir ispitiva nov zadatak preporuke liječnika kako bi omogućio automatsku parenju pacijenta liječniku s relevantnim stručnostima. Iako se većin a prethodnog rada u preporuki fokusira na modeliranje meta korisnika iz njihovog prethodnog ponašanja, možemo se osloniti na ograničene riječi u pitanju samo da uvjerimo potrebe pacijenta iz razloga privatnosti. Za modeliranje liječnika proučavamo zajedničke učinke njihovih profila i prethodnih dijaloga s drugim pacijentima i istražujemo njihove interakcije putem samouučenja. Učiti doktori su dalje zaposleni kako bi procijenili svoju mogućnost rješavanja pitanja pacijenata sa višeglavnim pažnjom mehanizma. Za eksperimente, velika skupina podataka se okuplja iz Chunyu Yisheng, kineskog internetskog zdravstvenog forum a, gdje naš model pokazuje rezultate stanja umjetnosti, izvršene osnovne linije razmatraju samo profile i prošle dijaloge kako bi se karakterizirali doktor.', 'bn': 'অনলাইন স্বাস্থ্য ফোরামে প্রতিদিন রোগীদের প্রশ্নের বিশাল প্রশ্ন উৎপাদন করা হয়েছে এবং হাতিয়ার ডাক্তারের কাজে কাজ করা রোগীদের সাহায্য করার জন্য এই পত্রিকাটি ডাক্তারের পরামর্শের একটি উপন্যাস গবেষণা করেছে যাতে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে একজন রোগীকে স্ব যদিও পরামর্শের বেশীরভাগ কাজ তাদের অতীতের আচরণ থেকে লক্ষ্য ব্যবহারকারীদের মডেল করার প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, আমরা শুধুমাত্র একটি প্রশ্নে নির্ভর করতে প ডাক্তার মডেলিং এর জন্য আমরা তাদের প্রোফাইল এবং পূর্ববর্তী আলোচনার যৌথ প্রভাব গবেষণা করি এবং অন্যান্য রোগীদের সাথে তাদের স্ শিক্ষার্থী ডাক্তারের বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতায় আরো কাজ করেছেন তাদের ক্ষমতা হিসেবে রোগীকে অনুসন্ধান করার ক্ষমতা দেখার পরীক্ষার জন্য চীনা অনলাইন স্বাস্থ্য ফোরাম চুনু ইশেঙ্গ থেকে একটি বিশাল পরিমাণ ডাটাসেট সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে, যেখানে আমাদের মডেল শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে, শুধু', 'ca': "Un gran nombre de preguntes de pacients es generen diariament en fòrums de salut en línia, fent que l'asignació manual del metge sigui una tasca intensiva de treball. Per ajudar millor els pacients, aquest paper estudia una nova tasca de recomanació del metge per permetre un parell automàtic d'un pacient amb un metge amb experiència pertinent. Mentre la majoria dels treballs anteriors en recomanació es centra en modelar els usuaris destinataris a partir del seu comportament passat, només podem confiar en les paraules limitades d'una pregunta per deduir les necessitats d'un pacient per raons de privacitat. Per a modelar metges, estudiem els efectes articulars dels seus perfils i diàlegs anteriors amb altres pacients i explorem les seves interaccions mitjançant l'autoaprenentatge. Les integracions del metge aprenguts són encara més empregades per estimar les seves capacitats de gestionar una consulta de pacients amb un mecanisme d'atenció multicapa. Per a experiments, un conjunt de dades a gran escala es recolliu de Chunyu Yisheng, un fòrum de salut en línia xinès, on el nostre model mostra els resultats més avançats, superant les línies de base només considerant perfils i diàlegs passats per caracteritzar un metge.", 'az': "Böyük səbir soruşmalarının günlük online sağlığı forumlarında təşkil edilir, əlavə doktorun təşkil etdiyi işin çoxluğunu təşkil edir. Hastalara daha yaxşı yardım etmək üçün, bu kağıt təhsil edən bir hastanın avtomatik bir çiftini möhüm təhsil sahibi bir doktora istifadə etmək üçün yeni bir iş təhsil edir. Ən əvvəlki təsirlərin məqsədilərini keçmiş davranışlarından modelləşdirmək üçün təsirlərin ehtiyacını təsdiqləmək üçün yalnız müəyyən edilmiş s özlərə təvəkkül edə bilərik. Doktor modelləri üçün, profillerinin və əvvəlki müzakirələrinin birləşdirilməsini və digər xəstələrlə birlikdə danışmaqlarını təhsil edirik və özləri öyrənmək vasitəsilə onların əlaqələrini keşf edirik. Öyrənmiş doktor inşalları çoxlu başlıq məhsaniyyəti ilə səbir soruşmağı təmin etmək üçün daha çox istifadə edilir. Həyatlar üçün böyük ölçü verilən quruluş Çin online sağlığı forumu Chunyu Yisheng'dən toplanır. Bizim modellərimiz bir doktoru təhsil etmək üçün profilleri və keçmiş dialogları təhsil edir.", 'cs': 'Na online zdravotních fórech jsou denně generovány obrovské množství dotazů pacientů, což činí ruční přidělování lékařů úkolem náročným na práci. Pro lepší pomoc pacientům, tento článek studuje nový úkol doporučení lékaře umožňující automatické párování pacienta s lékařem s relevantními odbornými znalostmi. Zatímco většina předchozích doporučení se zaměřuje na modelování cílových uživatelů z jejich minulého chování, můžeme se spolehnout pouze na omezená slova v dotazu, abychom odvodili potřeby pacienta z důvodů ochrany osobních údajů. Pro modelování lékařů studujeme společné účinky jejich profilů a předchozích dialogů s ostatními pacienty a zkoumáme jejich interakce prostřednictvím sebeučení. Naučené lékařské vložení jsou dále využity k odhadu jejich schopností zvládnout dotaz pacienta s vícehlavovým mechanismem pozornosti. Pro experimenty je shromážděn rozsáhlý datový soubor z čínského online zdravotnického fóra Chunyu Yisheng, kde náš model vykazuje nejmodernější výsledky, překonávající základní linie zohlední pouze profily a minulé dialogy k charakterizaci lékaře.', 'et': 'Iga päev luuakse tohutu hulk patsientide päringuid online tervishoiufoorumitel, muutes käsitsi arsti jaotamise töömahukaks ülesandeks. Patsientide paremaks abistamiseks uuritakse käesolevas dokumendis uut arsti soovituste ülesannet, mis võimaldab patsiendi automaatselt siduda asjakohase teadmisega arstiga. Kuigi enamik varasemaid soovitustööd keskendub sihtkasutajate modelleerimisele nende varasema käitumise põhjal, saame päringu piiratud sõnadele tugineda patsiendi vajadustele privaatsuse huvides. Arsti modelleerimiseks uurime nende profiilide ja varasemate dialoogide ühiseid mõjusid teiste patsientidega ning uurime nende koostoimeid eneseõppe kaudu. Õppinud arsti manustamist kasutatakse täiendavalt, et hinnata nende võimet käsitleda patsiendi päringut mitme peaga tähelepanu mehhanismiga. Eksperimentide jaoks kogutakse Hiina veebipõhiselt tervishoiufoorumilt Chunyu Yishengilt suuremahulist andmekogumit, kus meie mudel näitab kaasaegseid tulemusi, ületades lähtejooni ainult profiile ja varasemaid dialooge arsti iseloomustamiseks.', 'fi': 'Terveydenhuollon verkkofoorumeilla syntyy päivittäin valtavia määriä potilaskyselyjä, mikä tekee manuaalisesta lääkärin kohdistamisesta työvoimavaltaisen tehtävän. Potilaiden auttamiseksi tässä artikkelissa tutkitaan uutta lääkärin suositustehtävää, joka mahdollistaa potilaan automaattisen parittamisen lääkäriin, jolla on asiaankuuluvaa asiantuntemusta. Vaikka useimmat aiemmat suositukset keskittyvät kohdekäyttäjien mallintamiseen heidän aiemmasta käyttäytymisestään, voimme luottaa kyselyn rajallisiin sanoihin päätelläksemme potilaan tarpeet tietosuojasyistä. Lääkärimallinnusta varten tutkimme heidän profiiliensa yhteisvaikutuksia ja aiempia dialogejaan muiden potilaiden kanssa ja tutkimme heidän vuorovaikutustaan itseoppimisen kautta. Opittuja lääkäriupotuksia käytetään edelleen arvioimaan heidän kykyjään käsitellä potilaskyselyä monipäisen huomiomekanismin avulla. Kokeita varten kerätään laajamittainen aineisto kiinalaiselta terveysfoorumilta Chunyu Yishengiltä, jossa mallimme esittelee viimeisimpiä tuloksia, ja vertailuarvot ylittävät vain profiilit ja aiemmat dialogit lääkärin luonnehdinnaksi.', 'jv': 'TOMO sing paling berarti pangrungu sabên neng online Awak dhéwé luwih nêmên, kartuluh iki menèh basa nêmên karo pawaran pangan doktoran sing bisa ngubah isiné perusahaan maneh kanggo alih basa sing nêmên karo bekisan. layers-action Ngawe maneh model doktor, kita alih efet kanggo nyenenge nggawe profil karo dialog sing karo paciane oleh lan nganggep nglanggar interaksi kanggo nyenenge sampek dhéwé. embedding kanggo ujaran, sampeyan nganggo perusahaan langkung akeh dadi ampingan ning dunya Cunyu Yish,online forum sing resmi sing isine kanggo awak dhéwé modèl dhéwé iso ngerasakno perusahaan langkung sampeyan.', 'sk': 'Na spletnih zdravstvenih forumih dnevno ustvarjamo ogromne količine poizvedb pacientov, zaradi česar je ročna dodelitev zdravnikov delovno intenzivna naloga. Da bi bolje pomagali bolnikom, v tem prispevku preučujemo novo nalogo zdravniškega priporočila, ki omogoča samodejno povezovanje bolnika z zdravnikom z ustreznim strokovnim znanjem. Medtem ko se večina predhodnih priporočil osredotoča na modeliranje ciljnih uporabnikov iz njihovega preteklega vedenja, se lahko zanesemo le na omejene besede v poizvedbi, da ugotovimo potrebe pacienta iz razlogov zasebnosti. Za modeliranje zdravnikov preučujemo skupne učinke njihovih profilov in predhodnih dialogov z drugimi pacienti ter raziskujemo njihovo interakcijo preko samoučenja. Učene zdravniške vgradnje se nadalje uporabljajo za oceno njihovih zmožnosti obravnavanja poizvedbe pacienta z večglavnim mehanizmom pozornosti. Za poskuse zbiramo obsežen nabor podatkov iz kitajskega spletnega zdravstvenega foruma Chunyu Yisheng, kjer naš model prikazuje najsodobnejše rezultate, izboljšuje osnovne vrstice, upošteva le profile in pretekle dialoge za označevanje zdravnika.', 'ha': "QScriptBreakpointsModel To, dõmin ya ƙarfafa wa wagonjõni, wannan takarda yana karanta wani aikin nan na waraka wa daktari dõmin ya faratar da nau'i biyu farat ɗaya zuwa daktariki wanda na da masu sani. Waka da mafi ƙaranci da ke aiki cikin shawarar da ke muhalli masu motsari masu amfani da amfani da shi na gabani daga aikin da suka shige, sai za mu iya dõgara kawai ga maganar da aka ƙayyade a cikin tambayar, dõmin ya buga amfani da wagonjwa don sabo na farat ɗaya. Ki motsi na doki, muna karatun musamman matsayin ayukan su da mazaɓan ayukansu na zaman samun zajeyen ayukansu da wasu wagonjõni na daban kuma munã karatun masu shawara su a bayani na fara-cin. Babu wani doki wanda ya sanar da shi ana iya amfani da furo dõmin ya estimate abincin su iya karɓi tambayar jiran da wani mekanin masu ƙaranci. Aka samun jarrabãwa, aka sami tsarin danne mai girma daga ChuNy Yisheng, wani jukwari na aminci na China, a inda misalinmu yana nuna fassarar-kungiyar-sananni, kuma yana samun basuɗe-bango don ka yi amfani kawai ga misãlai da zauren akwatin bayani na farko dõmin ya yi karatu ga daktari.", 'he': "כמויות גדולות של שאלות מטופלים מיוצרות ביום יום על פורמים בריאות באינטרנט, הופכים פיצוע רופא ידני משימה אינטנסיבית עבודה. כדי לעזור יותר למטופלים, הנייר הזה לומד משימה חדשה של המלצה הרופאית כדי לאפשר זוג אוטומטי של מטופל לרופא עם מומחיות רלוונטית. בעוד רוב העבודה הקודמת בהמלצה מתמקדת בדוגמנית משתמשים מטרה מההתנהגות העברה שלהם, אנחנו יכולים לסמוך רק על המילים המוגבלות בשאלה כדי להוציא את הצרכים של מטופל מסיבות פרטיות. עבור דוגמניות רופאים, אנחנו חוקרים את השפעות המשותפות של פרופילים שלהם ודיולוגים קודמים עם חולים אחרים ולחקור את אינטראקציות שלהם דרך הלימוד עצמי. תוכניות הרופא הלמודים משתמשות יותר כדי להעריך את היכולת שלהם לטפל בסקרה של מטופל עם מנגנון תשומת לב רב ראשים. עבור ניסויים, קבוצת נתונים בקנה מידה גדולה אוספת מצ'וניו איישנג, פורום בריאות באינטרנט סיני, שבו המודל שלנו מציג את התוצאות המאודמות, ביצוע מעל קווי הבסיס שוקלים רק פרופילים ודיולוגים בעבר כדי לתייצב רופא.", 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་པ་ཚོའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གླེང་སྟེགས་ནས་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་རང་ཉིད་སྨན་པ་དང་སྤྲོད་སྤྲོད་ སྨན་ཚོགས་ལ་རོགས་རམ་པ་དང་། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྨན་པ་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ཆ་གསར་གཏོང་གི་བཀའ་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་དམིགས སྨན་པ་མ་དབུས་བཟོ་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གདོང་རིས་དང་སྔོན་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག སྨན་པ་ཞིག་གི་གནས་སྡུད་ཚབ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྙན་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱད་ནས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ ལག་འཚོལ་བ་དང་ཐོག་ལས་ཆེན་ཆེ་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཅིག་སྦྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་ནི་རྒྱ་ནག་ཡིག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གྲོང་འཕྲིན་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Pass off Fish Eyes for Pearls: Attacking Model Selection of Pre-trained Models', 'ar': 'الضبط الفوري المستمر لتتبع حالة الحوار', 'fr': "Réglage continu des invites pour le suivi de l'état du dialogue", 'es': 'Ajuste continuo de solicitudes para el seguimiento del estado de los cuadros', 'pt': 'Ajuste de prompt contínuo para rastreamento de estado de diálogo', 'ja': 'ダイアログの状態追跡のための継続的なプロンプトチューニング', 'zh': '对话框状连提调', 'ru': 'Непрерывная подсказка для отслеживания состояния диалогового окна', 'hi': 'संवाद स्थिति ट्रैकिंग के लिए निरंतर प्रॉम्प्ट ट्यूनिंग', 'ga': 'Tiúnadh Pras Leanúnach le haghaidh Rianú Stáit Dialóige', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სტატუსის შენახვა', 'hu': 'Folyamatos azonnali hangolás a párbeszédállapot nyomon követéséhez', 'el': 'Συνεχής έγκαιρη ρύθμιση για παρακολούθηση κατάστασης διαλόγου', 'it': 'Sintonizzazione rapida continua per il monitoraggio dello stato di dialogo', 'kk': 'Диалог күйін қадағалау', 'lt': 'Nuolatinis reklaminis derinimas dialogo būsenos sekimui', 'mk': 'Континуално препорачување за следење на состојбата на дијалогот', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Prompt Teruskan untuk Trek Keadaan Dialog', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ട്രാക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രോമ്ട് തുടരുക', 'mt': 'Tuning kontinwu bil-ħeffa għat-Traċċar tal-Istat tad-Djalogu', 'mn': 'Диалог улс дүрсийг дагах зөвлөгөө', 'pl': 'Ciągłe dostrajanie promocji dla śledzenia stanu dialogu', 'ro': 'Reglare rapidă continuă pentru urmărirea stării dialogului', 'sr': 'Kontinualno pitanje za praćenje države dijaloga', 'no': 'Kontinuer spørjingsstyring for dialogtilstand', 'so': 'Waxbarashada raadinta dowladda', 'si': 'සංවාද ස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න', 'sv': 'Kontinuerlig snabb inställning för spårning av dialogtillstånd', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் நாட்டு பின்பற்றிக்கான தொடர்ந்து துவக்கும் முயற்சி', 'ur': 'Dialog State Tracking کے لئے Continual Prompt Tuning', 'uz': 'Dialog holatini bosib chiqarish uchun davom etish', 'vi': 'Tiếp tục theo dõi trạng thái hộp thoại', 'bg': 'Непрекъснато настройване за проследяване на състоянието на диалога', 'da': 'Løbende hurtig justering for sporing af dialogtilstand', 'hr': 'Kontinualno pitanje za praćenje države dijaloga', 'nl': 'Continue prompt tuning voor het bijhouden van dialoogstatus', 'de': 'Kontinuierliche Abstimmung der Eingabeaufforderung für die Verfolgung des Dialogzustandes', 'id': 'Penyesuaian Prompt Lanjutan untuk Penjejakan Negara Dialog', 'fa': 'تنظیمات پیشنهاد ادامه برای ردیابی وضعیت دیalog', 'ko': '대화 상자 상태 추적 조정 프롬프트 지속', 'sw': 'Endelea jaribio la kufuatilia Taifa la Dialog', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i vazhdueshëm i nxitjes për gjurmimin e gjendjes së dialogut', 'af': 'Kontinueerde vraag aanpassing vir dialoog staat agtervolg', 'tr': 'Dälog Durumy Çykarmak üçin ön gitmek', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Dialog Eyaleti 캻zl톛m톛si', 'hy': 'Շարունակ խորհրդանշող հարմարեցման համար', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্রীয় অনুসন্ধানের জন্য চালিয়ে যাও', 'bs': 'Kontinualno pitanje za praćenje države dijaloga', 'ca': "Actualització prompte continua del seguiment de l'estat del diàleg", 'cs': 'Průběžné ladění výzvy pro sledování stavu dialogu', 'et': 'Dialoogi oleku jälgimise pidev häälestamine', 'fi': 'Jatkuva kehotteen viritys valintaikkunan tilan seurantaa varten', 'jv': 'Tuning', 'he': 'התרגיל הקידום המשיכי לאתר מצב הדיולוגים', 'sk': 'Nadaljnje nastavitev poziva za sledenje stanju pogovornega okna', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'མི་མཐུད་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གནས་ལུགས་རྗེས་ཀྱི་སྐུལ་སྐབས་འཕགས་རིས'}
{'en': 'Selecting an appropriate pre-trained model (PTM) for a specific downstream task typically requires significant efforts of fine-tuning. To accelerate this process, researchers propose feature-based model selection (FMS) methods, which assess PTMs’ transferability to a specific task in a fast way without fine-tuning. In this work, we argue that current FMS methods are vulnerable, as the assessment mainly relies on the static features extracted from PTMs. However, such features are derived without training PTMs on downstream tasks, and are not necessarily reliable indicators for the PTM’s transferability. To validate our viewpoints, we design two methods to evaluate the robustness of FMS: (1) model disguise attack, which post-trains an inferior PTM with a contrastive objective, and (2) evaluation data selection, which selects a subset of the data points for FMS evaluation based on K-means clustering. Experimental results prove that both methods can successfully make FMS mistakenly judge the transferability of PTMs. Moreover, we find that these two methods can further be combined with the backdoor attack to misguide the FMS to select poisoned models. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first work to demonstrate the defects of current FMS algorithms and evaluate their potential security risks. By identifying previously unseen risks of FMS, our study indicates new directions for improving the robustness of FMS.', 'ar': 'يجب أن يكون نظام الحوار المرغوب فيه قادرًا على تعلم مهارات جديدة باستمرار دون نسيان المهارات القديمة ، وبالتالي التكيف مع المجالات أو المهام الجديدة في دورة حياته. ومع ذلك ، فإن التدريب المستمر لنموذج غالبًا ما يؤدي إلى مشكلة نسيان كارثية معروفة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم الضبط الفوري المستمر ، إطار عمل فعال للمعلمات لا يتجنب النسيان فحسب ، بل يتيح أيضًا نقل المعرفة بين المهام. لتجنب النسيان ، نتعلم فقط ونخزن عددًا قليلاً من حفلات الزفاف المميزة لكل مهمة أثناء تجميد نموذج العمود الفقري المدربين مسبقًا. لتحقيق نقل المعرفة ثنائي الاتجاه بين المهام ، نقترح عدة تقنيات (التهيئة السريعة المستمرة ، ودمج الاستعلام ، وإعادة عرض الذاكرة) لنقل المعرفة من المهام السابقة وتقنية موجهة بالذاكرة لنقل المعرفة من المهام اللاحقة. توضح التجارب المكثفة فعالية وكفاءة طريقتنا المقترحة في التعلم المستمر لتتبع حالة الحوار ، مقارنة بخطوط الأساس الحديثة.', 'pt': 'Um sistema de diálogo desejável deve ser capaz de aprender continuamente novas habilidades sem esquecer as antigas e, assim, adaptar-se a novos domínios ou tarefas em seu ciclo de vida. No entanto, treinar continuamente um modelo geralmente leva a um conhecido problema de esquecimento catastrófico. Neste artigo, apresentamos o Ajuste de Prompt Contínuo, uma estrutura eficiente em parâmetros que não apenas evita o esquecimento, mas também permite a transferência de conhecimento entre tarefas. Para evitar o esquecimento, aprendemos e armazenamos apenas alguns embeddings de tokens de prompt para cada tarefa enquanto congelamos o modelo pré-treinado do backbone. Para alcançar a transferência de conhecimento bidirecional entre tarefas, propomos várias técnicas (inicialização contínua de prompt, fusão de consultas e repetição de memória) para transferir conhecimento de tarefas anteriores e uma técnica guiada por memória para transferir conhecimento de tarefas subsequentes. Extensos experimentos demonstram a eficácia e eficiência do nosso método proposto no aprendizado contínuo para rastreamento de estado de diálogo, em comparação com linhas de base de última geração.', 'es': 'Un sistema de diálogo deseable debe ser capaz de aprender continuamente nuevas habilidades sin olvidar las antiguas y, por lo tanto, adaptarse a nuevos dominios o tareas en su ciclo de vida. Sin embargo, el entrenamiento continuo de un modelo a menudo conduce a un conocido problema de olvido catastrófico. En este artículo, presentamos Continual Prompt Tuning, un marco eficiente en cuanto a parámetros que no solo evita el olvido, sino que también permite la transferencia de conocimientos entre tareas. Para evitar el olvido, solo aprendemos y almacenamos algunas incrustaciones de tokens rápidos para cada tarea mientras congelamos el modelo preentrenado de la red troncal. Para lograr una transferencia de conocimiento bidireccional entre tareas, proponemos varias técnicas (inicialización rápida continua, fusión de consultas y reproducción de memoria) para transferir el conocimiento de las tareas anteriores y una técnica guiada por la memoria para transferir el conocimiento de las tareas posteriores. Los experimentos exhaustivos demuestran la eficacia y eficiencia de nuestro método propuesto sobre el aprendizaje continuo para el seguimiento del estado del diálogo, en comparación con las líneas de base más modernas.', 'fr': "Un système de dialogue souhaitable doit être capable d'acquérir continuellement de nouvelles compétences sans oublier les anciennes, et de s'adapter ainsi à de nouveaux domaines ou tâches au cours de son cycle de vie. Cependant, la formation continue d'un modèle conduit souvent à un problème d'oubli catastrophique bien connu. Dans cet article, nous présentons le Continual Prompt Tuning, un cadre efficace en termes de paramètres qui non seulement évite l'oubli, mais permet également le transfert de connaissances entre les tâches. Pour ne pas oublier, nous n'apprenons et ne stockons que quelques embeddings de jetons d'invite pour chaque tâche tout en gelant le modèle pré-entraîné backbone. Pour réaliser un transfert de connaissances bidirectionnel entre les tâches, nous proposons plusieurs techniques (initialisation continue des invites, fusion de requêtes et relecture de la mémoire) pour transférer les connaissances des tâches précédentes et une technique guidée par la mémoire pour transférer les connaissances des tâches suivantes. Des expériences approfondies démontrent l'efficacité et l'efficience de la méthode que nous proposons sur l'apprentissage continu pour le suivi de l'état des dialogues, par rapport aux bases de référence les plus récentes.", 'ja': '望ましいダイアログシステムは、古いスキルを忘れることなく継続的に新しいスキルを学び、それによってライフサイクルの新しいドメインまたはタスクに適応できるはずです。 しかし、モデルを継続的に訓練することは、よく知られた壊滅的な忘却問題につながることが多い。 この論文では、忘れを回避するだけでなく、タスク間の知識移転を可能にするパラメータ効率の高いフレームワークであるContinual Prompt Tuningを提示する。 忘れないように、バックボーンの事前にトレーニングされたモデルを凍結しながら、タスクごとにいくつかのプロンプトトークンの埋め込みを学習して保存します。 タスク間の双方向の知識転送を実現するために、先行タスクから知識を転送するためのいくつかのテクニック（継続的なプロンプト初期化、クエリ融合、およびメモリリプレイ）と、後続タスクから知識を転送するためのメモリ誘導テクニックを提案する。 広範な実験は、最先端のベースラインと比較して、ダイアログ状態追跡のための継続的学習に関する提案された方法の有効性と効率性を示しています。', 'zh': '言统宜学新技能不忘旧能,以应其生命周期之新域。 然习模常致灾难性遗忘。 本文之中,连言调优,此参数高效之框架,不惟可以免遗忘,又可以知移于任也。 为免遗忘,学存提示令牌嵌,冻骨干教模。 为任之双向移,吾有数术(连言初始化,询其融记)以移其前,与一记引术,以移后知。 博实验证至基线,言有效性与效率。', 'ru': 'Желательная диалоговая система должна быть в состоянии непрерывно осваивать новые навыки, не забывая старые, и тем самым адаптироваться к новым областям или задачам на протяжении своего жизненного цикла. Однако постоянное обучение модели часто приводит к хорошо известной катастрофической проблеме забывания. В этой статье мы представляем Непрерывную подсказку, эффективную по параметрам структуру, которая не только избегает забывания, но и позволяет передавать знания между задачами. Чтобы не забывать, мы изучаем и храним только несколько вложений токенов-подсказок для каждой задачи, замораживая предварительно обученную модель. Для достижения двунаправленной передачи знаний между задачами мы предлагаем несколько методов (непрерывная быстрая инициализация, слияние запросов и воспроизведение памяти) для передачи знаний из предыдущих задач и метод, управляемый памятью, для передачи знаний из последующих задач. Обширные эксперименты демонстрируют эффективность и действенность предлагаемого нами метода непрерывного обучения для отслеживания состояния диалога по сравнению с современными базовыми линиями.', 'hi': 'एक वांछनीय संवाद प्रणाली को पुराने लोगों को भूलने के बिना लगातार नए कौशल सीखने में सक्षम होना चाहिए, और इस तरह अपने जीवन चक्र में नए डोमेन या कार्यों के अनुकूल होना चाहिए। हालांकि, लगातार एक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने से अक्सर एक प्रसिद्ध विनाशकारी भूलने वाले मुद्दे की ओर जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम निरंतर प्रॉम्प्ट ट्यूनिंग प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक पैरामीटर-कुशल ढांचा जो न केवल भूलने से बचता है, बल्कि कार्यों के बीच ज्ञान हस्तांतरण को भी सक्षम बनाता है। भूलने से बचने के लिए, हम केवल बैकबोन पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल को फ्रीज करते हुए प्रत्येक कार्य के लिए कुछ प्रॉम्प्ट टोकन के एम्बेडिंग सीखते हैं और स्टोर करते हैं। कार्यों के बीच द्वि-दिशात्मक ज्ञान हस्तांतरण प्राप्त करने के लिए, हम कई तकनीकों (निरंतर त्वरित प्रारंभिककरण, क्वेरी संलयन, और मेमोरी रिप्ले) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं ताकि पूर्ववर्ती कार्यों से ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित किया जा सके और बाद के कार्यों से ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए एक मेमोरी-निर्देशित तकनीक हो सके। व्यापक प्रयोगों ने संवाद राज्य ट्रैकिंग के लिए निरंतर सीखने पर हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि की प्रभावशीलता और दक्षता का प्रदर्शन किया, जो अत्याधुनिक बेसलाइन की तुलना में है।', 'ga': 'Ba cheart go mbeadh córas dialóige inmhianaithe in ann scileanna nua a fhoghlaim go leanúnach gan dearmad a dhéanamh ar na cinn d’aois, agus ar an gcaoi sin oiriúnú d’fhearainn nó do thascanna nua ina shaolré. Mar sin féin, is minic a bhíonn saincheist thubaisteach dearmadta mar thoradh ar shamhail a oiliúint go leanúnach. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair Tiúnadh Pras Leanúnach, creat atá éifeachtach ó thaobh paraiméadar de a sheachnaíonn ní amháin dearmad ach a chuireann ar chumas aistriú eolais idir tascanna. Chun dearmad a sheachaint, ní fhoghlaimímid agus ní stórálaimid ach cúpla leabú comharthaí pras do gach tasc agus an tsamhail réamhoilte cnámh droma á reo. Chun aistriú déthreorach eolais i measc tascanna a bhaint amach, molaimid roinnt teicníochtaí (tosú leanúnach pras, comhleá ceisteanna, agus athimirt cuimhne) chun eolas a aistriú ó thascanna roimhe seo agus teicníocht chuimhne-threoraithe chun eolas a aistriú ó thascanna ina dhiaidh sin. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing éifeachtacht agus éifeachtúlacht ár modh molta ar fhoghlaim leanúnach do rianú stáit dialóige, i gcomparáid leis na bunlínte úrscothach.', 'el': 'Ένα επιθυμητό σύστημα διαλόγου θα πρέπει να είναι σε θέση να μαθαίνει συνεχώς νέες δεξιότητες χωρίς να ξεχνά τις παλιές και έτσι να προσαρμόζεται σε νέους τομείς ή καθήκοντα στον κύκλο ζωής του. Ωστόσο, η συνεχής εκπαίδευση ενός μοντέλου συχνά οδηγεί σε ένα γνωστό καταστροφικό ζήτημα λησμονής. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε το Συνεχής Γρήγορο Συντονισμό, ένα πλαίσιο αποδοτικό σε παραμέτρους που όχι μόνο αποφεύγει τη λησμονή αλλά και επιτρέπει τη μεταφορά γνώσης μεταξύ των εργασιών. Για να μην ξεχνάμε, μαθαίνουμε και αποθηκεύουμε μόνο μερικά στιγμιαία σύμβολα ενσωμάτωσης για κάθε εργασία, ενώ παγώνουμε το προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο της σπονδυλικής στήλης. Για την επίτευξη αμφίδρομης μεταφοράς γνώσης μεταξύ των εργασιών, προτείνουμε διάφορες τεχνικές (συνεχής άμεση αρχικοποίηση, συγχώνευση ερωτήματος και επανάληψη μνήμης) για τη μεταφορά γνώσης από προηγούμενες εργασίες και μια τεχνική καθοδηγούμενη από τη μνήμη για τη μεταφορά γνώσης από επόμενες εργασίες. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα και την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου συνεχούς μάθησης για παρακολούθηση κατάστασης διαλόγου, σε σύγκριση με τις τελευταίες γραμμές βάσης.', 'hu': 'Egy kívánatos párbeszédrendszernek képesnek kell lennie arra, hogy folyamatosan új készségeket tanuljon anélkül, hogy megfeledkezne a régiekről, és ezáltal alkalmazkodjon az életciklus új területeihez vagy feladataihoz. A modell folyamatos képzése azonban gyakran jól ismert katasztrofális felejtési problémához vezet. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a folyamatos gyors hangolást, egy paraméter-hatékony keretrendszert, amely nemcsak elkerüli a felejtést, hanem lehetővé teszi a feladatok közötti tudásátadást is. Az elfelejtés elkerülése érdekében csak néhány prompt tokenbeágyazást tanulunk és tárolunk minden feladathoz, miközben befagyasztjuk az előre kiképzett gerincmodellt. A feladatok közötti kétirányú tudástranszfer elérése érdekében több technikát javasolunk (folyamatos prompt inicializálás, lekérdezés fúzió és memória visszajátszás) az előző feladatokból származó ismeretek átadására, valamint memória-vezérelt technikát a későbbi feladatokból származó ismeretek átadására. Széleskörű kísérletek mutatják be javasolt módszerünk hatékonyságát és hatékonyságát a párbeszédállapot követésére, összehasonlítva a legkorszerűbb alapvető vonalakkal.', 'ka': 'უნდა შეუძლებელი დიალოგური სისტემა შეუძლებელია ყოველთვის ახალი მეცნიერების შესაძლებლობა, უცხოვრებით დახსოვრებით, და ამიტომ ახალი დიალოგური ან დავალებების შესაძლებლო მაგრამ, ყოველთვის მოდელის განაკეთებას ძალიან უცნობილი კატატროფიური პრობლემაში დაბრუნდება. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ გავაჩვენებთ Continual Prompt Tuning, პარამეტრის ეფექტიური ფრამეტრი, რომელიც არა მხოლოდ დახსოვრებს, მაგრამ უნდა იცნობის გადატანაცია საქმედების შორის. თუ არ დავიწყებთ, ჩვენ ვისწავლით და დავკეთებთ რამდენიმე წინაღმდენის კონფიგურაციას ყოველ დავალებისთვის, როცა წინაღმდენიმე მოდელს წინაღმდენობით დამ ჩვენ უნდა გავაკეთოთ რამდენიმე ტექნოგიები (მუშაობელი თნციალიზაცია, კითხვა ფუზაცია და მეხსიერების გადასვლა) მეცნიერების გადასვლა წინ დავალებით და მეხსიერების გადასვლა ტექნოგია, რომელიც შემდეგ დავალებ განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებს ჩვენი მინდა მეტის ეფექტიურობას და ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული სწავლებას დიალოგის სტატურის შენახვა სტატურებ', 'it': "Un sistema di dialogo auspicabile dovrebbe essere in grado di apprendere continuamente nuove competenze senza dimenticare quelle vecchie e quindi adattarsi a nuovi domini o compiti nel suo ciclo di vita. Tuttavia, la formazione continua di un modello porta spesso a un noto problema catastrofico di dimenticanza. In questo articolo presentiamo Continual Prompt Tuning, un framework efficiente in termini di parametri che non solo evita di dimenticare, ma consente anche il trasferimento di conoscenze tra attività e attività. Per evitare di dimenticare, impariamo e memorizziamo solo alcuni embedding di token prompt per ogni attività, congelando il modello della spina dorsale pre-addestrato. Per ottenere il trasferimento bidirezionale delle conoscenze tra le attività, proponiamo diverse tecniche (inizializzazione continua del prompt, fusione delle query e replay della memoria) per trasferire le conoscenze dai compiti precedenti e una tecnica guidata dalla memoria per trasferire le conoscenze dai compiti successivi. Esperimenti approfonditi dimostrano l'efficacia e l'efficienza del nostro metodo proposto sull'apprendimento continuo per il monitoraggio dello stato di dialogo, rispetto a linee di base all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'pageidaujama dialogo sistema turėtų turėti galimybę nuolat mokytis naujų įgūdžių nepamirštant senų įgūdžių ir taip prisitaikyti prie naujų sričių ar užduočių savo gyvenimo ciklo. However, continually training a model often leads to a well-known catastrophic forgetting issue.  Šiame dokumente pristatome nuolatinį greitą pritaikymą, veiksmingą parametrų sistemą, kuri ne tik vengia pamiršti, bet ir leidžia perduoti žinias tarp užduočių. Siekiant išvengti pamiršimo, mes mokome ir saugome tik keletą greitų ženklų įdėjimų kiekvienam uždaviniui užšaldant nugaros kaulų išankstinio mokymo model į. Siekiant dvikrypčio žinių perdavimo tarp užduočių, siūlome keletą metodų (nuolatinio greito inicijavimo, klausimų sintezės ir atminties atkūrimo) žinioms perduoti iš ankstesnių užduočių ir atminties pagrįstoms technologijoms perduoti žinias iš vėlesnių užduočių. Išsamūs eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas nuolatinio mokymosi dialogo būsenos stebėjimo metodas yra veiksmingas ir veiksmingas, palyginti su naujausiomis bazinėmis linijomis.', 'mk': 'Посакуваниот дијалог систем треба да може постојано да научи нови вештини без да ги заборави старите, и со тоа да се адаптира на нови домени или задачи во својот животен циклус. Сепак, постојаното обука на модел честопати води до познато катастрофално заборавување. Во овој документ, го претставуваме континуалното поттикнување, рамка ефикасна за параметри која не само избегнува заборавување, туку и овозможува трансфер на знаење помеѓу задачите. За да избегнеме да заборавиме, научиме и складираме само неколку брзи знаци за секоја задача додека го замрзнуваме предобучениот модел. To achieve bi-directional knowledge transfer among tasks, we propose several techniques (continual prompt initialization, query fusion, and memory replay) to transfer knowledge from preceding tasks and a memory-guided technique to transfer knowledge from subsequent tasks.  Extensive experiments demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of our proposed method on continual learning for dialog state tracking, compared with state-of-the-art baselines.', 'kk': 'Қалайтын диалог жүйесі ескі жүйелерді ұмытпай, жаңа және тапсырмаларды үйрене алады. Сонымен өмір циклінде жаңа домендерге не тапсырмаларда адаптау керек. Бірақ үлгісін әрқашан оқыту көбінесе белгілі қаттастрофиялық мәселеге өткізеді. Бұл қағазда, біз жалғастыру сұрақтарын баптау, параметрлердің эффективті қоршауын көрсетедік. Бұл тек ұмытқан емес, сондай-ақ білім тапсырмалар арасындағы тапсырм Бір тапсырманы ұмытқан үшін, біз тек бірнеше сұрақ тапсырманың ендіруін үйренеміз және сақтаймыз. Тапсырмалар арасындағы екі бағытты білім аударуын жеткізу үшін бірнеше техникалық (тұрақты сұрау инициализациясы, сұрау және жады қайталау) мәліметтерді алдыңғы тапсырмалардан және мәліметтерді тапсырмалардан аудару үшін Кеңейтілген тәжірибелер диалог күйін қадағалау үшін жұмыс істеу әдісіміздің эффективнігін және эффективнігін көрсетеді. Сурет күйінің негізгі жолдарымен салыстырылған', 'ml': 'ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പുതിയ കഴിവുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതാണ്. പഴയ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d മറന്നുപോകാ എന്നാലും, എപ്പോഴും ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നുണ്ടായിരുന്നുവെങ്കിലും വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിപത് In this paper, we present Continual Prompt Tuning, a parameter-efficient framework that not only avoids forgetting but also enables knowledge transfer between tasks.  മറക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും മറക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാ ജോലിയ്ക്കും വേണ്ടി കുറച്ച് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഒളിവുകളുടെ അകത്തേക്ക് സൂക്ഷിക ജോലികള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d നിന്നും നേരിട്ടുള്ള അറിവ് മാറ്റുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ടെക്കിനിക്കുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ജ്ഞാനം മാറ്റുവാന്\u200d വേ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയിലെ പ്രവർത്തനവും പ്രവർത്തനവും കാണിക്കുന്നു. ഡയലോഗ് രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ', 'mt': 'Sistema ta’ djalogu mixtieqa għandha tkun tista’ titgħallem ħiliet ġodda kontinwament mingħajr ma tinsa dawk antiki, u b’hekk tadatta għal oqsma jew kompiti ġodda fiċ-ċiklu tal-ħajja tagħha. Madankollu, it-taħriġ kontinwu ta’ mudell ta’ spiss iwassal għal kwistjoni ta’ tinsa katastrofika magħrufa sew. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw Tuning Kontinwu Prompt, qafas effiċjenti fil-parametri li mhux biss jevita li tinsa iżda jippermetti wkoll it-trasferiment tal-għarfien bejn il-kompiti. Biex jiġi evitat li ninsew, a ħna nitgħallmu u nħażnu biss ftit inkorporazzjonijiet tat-tokens fil-pront għal kull kompitu waqt li nffriżaw il-mudell imħarreġ minn qabel tad-dahar. Biex jinkiseb trasferiment ta’ għarfien bidirezzjonali fost il-kompiti, nipproponu diversi tekniki (inizjalizzazzjoni kontinwa fil-pront, fużjoni tal-mistoqsijiet, u riproduzzjoni tal-memorja) biex jittrasferixxu l-għarfien minn kompiti preċedenti u teknika ggwidata mill-memorja biex jittrasferixxu l-għarfien minn kompiti sussegwenti. Esperimenti estensivi juru l-effettività u l-effiċjenza tal-metodu propost tagħna dwar it-tagħlim kontinwu għat-traċċar tal-istat tad-djalogu, meta mqabbel mal-linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Шинэ чадваруудын систем хуучин хүмүүсийг мартахгүй шинэ чадваруудыг үргэлж сурах боломжтой болно. Энэ нь амьдралын циклийн шинэ газрын эсвэл даалгаваруудыг зохицуулах боломжтой. Гэвч загварыг дасгалж суралцах нь ихэвчлэн мэддэг гамшигтай асуудлыг мартдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид үргэлжлүүлэх хөгжлийн хөгжлийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь зүгээр л мартахгүй, мөн ажлын хооронд мэдлэгийг шилжүүлэх боломжтой. Бид зүгээр л мартахын тулд ажил бүрт хэдэн хурдан томъёог суралцаж, хадгалах хэрэгтэй болно. Бид ажлын хоорондоо хоёр чиглэлийн мэдлэг шилжүүлэхэд олон техникуудыг (үргэлжлүүлэх, query fusion, санамжлалтын дахин дахин дахин) мэдлэгийг өмнө ажлын талаас, санамжлалтын удирдлагатай техник, дараагийн ажлын мэдлэгийг шилжүүлэх боломжтой техник Маш олон туршилтууд бидний санал өгсөн аргын үр дүнтэй суралцах талаар ярианы улс орнуудын даалгаврын тухай харьцуулахад бидний үйлдвэрлэлийн үр дүнтэй болон үр дүнтэй ажиллагааг харуулдаг.', 'ms': 'Sistem dialog yang diinginkan patut mampu terus-menerus belajar kemampuan baru tanpa melupakan kemampuan lama, dan dengan itu menyesuaikan diri kepada domain atau tugas baru dalam siklus hidupnya. Namun, latihan terus menerus model sering membawa kepada masalah melupakan bencana yang diketahui. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Penyesuaian Prompt Teruskan, kerangka yang berkesan parameter yang tidak hanya mengelakkan melupakan tetapi juga membolehkan pemindahan pengetahuan antara tugas. Untuk menghindari melupakan, kita hanya belajar dan menyimpan beberapa bentuk token prompt untuk setiap tugas sementara membeku model praterlatih tulang belakang. Untuk mencapai pemindahan pengetahuan bidireksi diantara tugas, kami cadangkan beberapa teknik (pemasangan prompt terus menerus, pemindahan pertanyaan, dan permainan semula ingatan) untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari tugas sebelumnya dan teknik yang dipandu ingatan untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari tugas seterusnya. Eksperimen luas menunjukkan keefektivitas dan efisiensi kaedah kami diusulkan untuk belajar terus menerus untuk pengesan keadaan dialog, dibandingkan dengan garis dasar state-of-the-art.', 'no': 'Ein ønskjer dialogsystemet bør kunna fortsatt lære nye ferdighetar utan å glemme gamle, og dermed tilpassar nye domene eller oppgåver i livetsikkelen. Men kontinuerleg opplæring av eit modell fører ofte til ein kjent katastrofisk glemmende problem. I denne papiret viser vi kontinuell prompt-tilpassing, eit parameter-effektivt rammeverk som ikkje berre unngår å glemme, men også gjer kunnskap-overføring mellom oppgåver. For å unngå å å glemme, lærer vi berre og lagra ein par spørsmålteikn for kvar oppgåve ved å frysera bakgrunnsbene før- trenga modellen. For å oppnå bi directional kunnskap overføring mellom oppgåver, foreslår vi fleire teknikk (kontinuerleg prompt initialisering, spørjingsfunksjon og minne- replay) for å overføra kunnskap frå førre oppgåver og ein minne- hjelpetekstikk for å overføra kunnskap frå førre oppgåver. Ekstra eksperimenter viser effektiviteten og effektiviteten av vårt foreslått metode på kontinuerlæring for dialogtilstand-sporing, samanlikna med kunstbaselinjer.', 'pl': 'Pożądany system dialogu powinien być w stanie stale uczyć się nowych umiejętności, nie zapominając o starych, a tym samym dostosowywać się do nowych dziedzin lub zadań w swoim cyklu życia. Jednak ciągłe szkolenie modelu często prowadzi do dobrze znanego katastrofalnego zapomnienia. W artykule przedstawiamy Continual Prompt Tuning, parametrowo efektywne ramy, które nie tylko unikają zapominania, ale także umożliwiają transfer wiedzy między zadaniami. Aby uniknąć zapomnienia, uczymy się i przechowujemy tylko kilka szybkich osadzeń tokenów dla każdego zadania podczas zamrażania wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu kręgosłupa. Aby osiągnąć dwukierunkowy transfer wiedzy między zadaniami, proponujemy kilka technik (ciągła inicjalizacja promocji, fuzja zapytań i powtórka pamięci) do transferu wiedzy z poprzednich zadań oraz technikę kierowaną pamięcią do transferu wiedzy z kolejnych zadań. Obszerne eksperymenty pokazują skuteczność i skuteczność proponowanej przez nas metody ciągłego uczenia się w celu śledzenia stanu dialogu, w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszymi liniami bazowymi.', 'si': 'අවශ්\u200dය සංවාද පද්ධතියක් පුළුවන් වැරදි අමතක නැති අලුත් ක්\u200dරියාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, ඒ වගේම අලුත් ඩෝමේන් නැති ක්\u200dරියා නමුත්, නිතරම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් හොඳට දන්න පුළුවන් අමතක වෙනවා. මේ පැත්තට, අපි දිගටම ප්\u200dරොම්ප්ට් ටුන්ජින් කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, පැරැමිටර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි අමතක කරන්න බැරි වෙන් අමතක කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, අපි හැම වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ඉගෙන ගන්න හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම හැම වැඩකට හ අවස්ථාවයෙන් දෙවෙනි දැනගන්න, අපි අවස්ථාවක් විතරයි (නිතරම් ප්\u200dරමාණය, ප්\u200dරශ්නය, මතකය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය, සහ මතකය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය) දැනගන්න පුරුද්ධ විස්තර පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට සංවාද කාරණාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සහ', 'ro': 'Un sistem de dialog de dorit ar trebui să fie capabil să învețe continuu noi abilități, fără a le uita pe cele vechi și, astfel, să se adapteze la noi domenii sau sarcini în ciclul său de viață. Cu toate acestea, formarea continuă a unui model duce adesea la o bine cunoscută problemă catastrofală de uitare. În această lucrare, prezentăm Tuning prompt continuu, un cadru eficient de parametri care nu numai că evită uitarea, dar permite și transferul de cunoștințe între sarcini. Pentru a evita uitarea, învățăm și stocăm doar câteva încorporări prompte de jetoane pentru fiecare sarcină, în timp ce înghețăm modelul coloanei vertebrale pre-antrenat. Pentru a realiza transferul bidirecțional de cunoștințe între sarcini, propunem mai multe tehnici (inițializarea promptă continuă, fuziunea interogărilor și reluarea memoriei) pentru transferul cunoștințelor din sarcinile anterioare și o tehnică ghidată de memorie pentru transferul cunoștințelor din sarcinile ulterioare. Experimentele ample demonstrează eficiența și eficiența metodei noastre propuse privind învățarea continuă pentru urmărirea stărilor de dialog, comparativ cu liniile de bază de ultimă generație.', 'so': 'Sida darteed waxaa haboon in nidaamka dialogka ah uu awoodo inuu mar walba barto aqoonta cusub iyadoon halmaamin gaboobayaasha, markaasna uu ku habboon karo goobaha cusub ama shaqooyinka isbaaskiisa nolosha. However, continually training a model often leads to a well-known catastrophic forgetting issue.  Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa baaritaanka sii-socda, kaas oo ah sawir faa’iido leh oo aan ka leexan halmaanshada oo keliya laakiin waxaynu awoodnaa in aqoonta lagu wareejiyo shaqada dhexdooda. Si aan u illoobno, waxaynu baranaynaa oo ku kaydsanaynaa meelaha ugu dhaqsaha calaamadaha shaqada oo dhan marka uu qabsado tusaale-barashada hore ee lafta. Si aan u helno safarka aqoonta tooska ah oo shaqaalaha u dhexeeya, waxaynu u soo jeedinaynaa qaabab badan (horumarinta joogtada ah, weydiinta fududaanka, iyo dib u soo celinta xasuusta) in aqoonta laga beddelo shaqaalaha hore iyo teknikada xusuusta la hagay si loo beddelo aqoonta shaqada dabadeed. Imtixaano dheeraad ah waxay muujiyaan shaqaalaha iyo saameyn ku saabsan waxbarashada joogtada ah ee qoraalka, iyadoo la barbaranaya qoraalka qoraalka.', 'sr': 'Željni dijalogski sistem bi trebao biti u stanju stalno naučiti nove vještine bez zaboravljanja starih, i tako se prilagodi novim domenama ili zadatkima u svom životnom ciklusu. Međutim, stalno obučavanje model a često vodi do poznatog katastrofskog zaboravljanja pitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo kontinualnu prometnu prilagodbu, parametrijski okvir koji ne samo izbjegava zaboravljanje, nego i omogućava prenošenje znanja između zadataka. Da bismo izbjegli zaboravljanje, naučili smo i čuvali samo nekoliko brzog znakova za svaki zadatak dok se smrzavamo predobučeni model leđa kosti. Da bismo postigli dvosmjernu prijenos znanja među zadacima, predlažemo nekoliko tehnika (stalna brza inicijalizacija, pitanje fuzije i ponovno uspomena) da prenesu znanje iz prethodnih zadataka i tehnike vodjene na pamćenje da prenese znanja iz sljedećih zadataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost i efikasnost našeg predloženog metoda o kontinualnom učenju za praćenje država dijaloga u usporedbi sa državnim osnovnim linijama umjetnosti.', 'sv': 'Ett önskvärt dialogsystem bör kontinuerligt kunna lära sig nya färdigheter utan att glömma gamla och därmed anpassa sig till nya områden eller uppgifter i sin livscykel. Att ständigt utbilda en modell leder dock ofta till en välkänd katastrofal glömsfråga. I denna uppsats presenterar vi Continual Prompt Tuning, ett parametereffektivt ramverk som inte bara undviker att glömma utan också möjliggör kunskapsöverföring mellan uppgifter. För att undvika att glömma, lär vi oss och lagrar bara några få prompt tokens inbäddningar för varje uppgift samtidigt som vi fryser ryggraden förintränad modell. För att uppnå dubbelriktad kunskapsöverföring mellan uppgifter föreslår vi flera tekniker (kontinuerlig prompt initialisering, frågefusion och minnesreplay) för att överföra kunskap från tidigare uppgifter och en minnesstyrd teknik för att överföra kunskap från efterföljande uppgifter. Omfattande experiment visar effektiviteten och effektiviteten hos vår föreslagna metod för kontinuerlig inlärning för spårning av dialogtillstånd, jämfört med state-of-the-art baslinjer.', 'ta': "ஒரு தேவையான உரையாடல் முறைமையில் பழைய திறமைகளை மறந்து விடாமல் தொடர்ந்து புதிய திறமைகளை கற்றலாம், அதனால் புதிய களங்கள் அல்லது பணிகள ஆனால், தொடர்ந்து பயிற்சி ஒரு மாதிரி பெரும்பாலும் நன்றாக அறியப்பட்ட பிரச்சனையை மறந்து விடுகிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தொடர்ந்து கொண்டிருக்கிறோம், ஒரு அளபுரு தேவையான சட்டம், மறந்து விடுவதை மட்டும் தவிர்க்கவில்லை ஆனால் பணிகள To avoid forgetting, we only learn and store a few prompt tokens' embeddings for each task while freezing the backbone pre-trained model.  செயல்களுக்கிடையில் இருதிசையாக அறிவு மாற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் பல தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் (தொடர்ந்து துவங்குதல், கேள்வி மூட்டுதல், நினைவு மீட்டுதல், முன்ன விரிவான சோதனைகள் தொடர்ந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ள எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையின் விளைவும் விளைவும் தெளிவாக்குகிறது, உரையாடல் நிலை", 'ur': 'ایک چاہنے والی ڈیلوگ سیسٹم باقی رہنے کے لئے نئی کائنات یاد کرنا چاہیے بغیر بوڑھے لوگوں کو بھول جائے اور اس کے ذریعے نئی دامین یا عملیات کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنا چاہیے۔ اگرچہ، ایک مدل کی تعلیم ادامه کرتی ہے، بہت زیادہ معلوم ہے کہ ایک مصیبت بھول جاتی ہے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں ہمیشہ قائم رہنے والے Prompt Tuning کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک پارامیٹ-فعالیت فرم جو نہیں صرف بھول جانے سے روکتا ہے بلکہ علم کو کاموں کے درمیان تغییر پر قائم کرتا ہے. بھولنے سے بچنے کے لئے ہم صرف ایک کم پیش آموزش کی موڈل کے لئے ایک کم پیش آموزش کی نشانیاں سیکھتے اور ذخیره کرتے ہیں۔ تابعوں کے درمیان دوسری طرف سے علم کا انتقال پہنچانے کے لئے ہم بہت سی تکنیک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں (ہمیشہ پیغام پہنچانے کے لئے، پیغام پیدا کرنے کے لئے، پیغام پیدا کرنے کے لئے، اور یاد پیدا کرنے کے لئے) اگلے تابعوں سے علم کو انتقال کرنے کے لئے اور ایک یاد دہانی تکنیک کے ذریعہ سے پہنچانے اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کے مطابق اور فعالیت کو دکھاتے ہیں، جس طرح بائستر بنسلین کے مقابلہ میں دائوال سیکھنے کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے ہمیشہ سیکھنے کے لئے۔', 'vi': 'Một hộp thoại phù hợp sẽ có thể tiếp tục học những kỹ năng mới mà không quên những kĩ năng cũ, và sau đó thích nghi với những miền hay các công việc mới trong vòng đời của nó. Tuy nhiên, việc huấn luyện một mô hình thường dẫn đến một vấn đề quên lãng thảm họa nổi tiếng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu Những bước nhanh liên tục, một khung hình hiệu quả tham số không chỉ tránh bị quên lãng mà còn cho phép truyền tri thức giữa các nhiệm vụ. Để tránh bị lãng quên, chúng tôi chỉ học và lưu trữ vài dấu hiệu đính kèm cho mỗi nhiệm vụ trong khi đóng băng mẫu xương sống được đào tạo sẵn. Để thực hiện việc luân chuyển tri thức hai hướng giữa các nhiệm vụ, chúng tôi đề xuất một số kỹ thuật (khởi động liên tục, kết hợp các yêu cầu, và lặp lại trí nhớ) để truyền đạt kiến thức từ các công việc trước và một kỹ thuật mách dẫn trí nhớ để chuyển đổi kiến thức từ các nhiệm vụ sau. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ chứng minh hiệu quả và hiệu quả của phương pháp được đề nghị về việc học liên tục theo dõi trạng thái hộp thoại, so với các nền văn bản hiện đại.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, davomida modelni o'rganishda ko'pincha yaxshi taqdim holatni o'zgartiradi. Bu qogʻozda biz vazifalar orasidan ta'sirish imkoniyatini davom etamiz, parametr effektiv freymini hozirganamiz. Oʻchirib qolish uchun biz faqat o'rganamiz va har bir vazifa uchun bir necha davomida tegnlarni saqlab qolamiz. Ushbu tugmani o'rganadigan foydalanuvchi modelni chiqishda. Vazifalar orqali bir xil taʼlumotni olib tashlash uchun, biz bir necha teknologiya (davomida ishga tushirish, qidirish va xotira javob berish) va keyingi vazifalardan ilmiyni olib tashlash uchun oldingi vazifalar va xotira yordamida boshlash uchun xotira-qoʻllanmalar. Koʻproq taʼminlovchilar taʼminlovchi muloqat soʻzni taʼminlashtirish usulining effektligini va effektligini ko'rsatadi.", 'bg': 'Една желана диалогова система трябва да може непрекъснато да учи нови умения, без да забравя старите, и по този начин да се адаптира към нови области или задачи в жизнения си цикъл. Въпреки това, непрекъснатото обучение на модел често води до добре известен катастрофален проблем със забравянето. В тази статия представяме рамка, ефективна за параметри, която не само избягва забравянето, но и позволява трансфер на знания между задачите. За да избегнем забравянето, ние научаваме и съхраняваме само няколко импровизирани символа за всяка задача, докато замразяваме гръбначния стълб предварително обучен модел. За да се постигне двупосочен трансфер на знания между задачите, предлагаме няколко техники (непрекъснато инициализиране на бърза заявка, сливане на заявки и повторно възпроизвеждане на паметта) за прехвърляне на знания от предходни задачи и техника, ръководена от паметта, за прехвърляне на знания от следващи задачи. Обширни експерименти демонстрират ефективността и ефективността на предлагания от нас метод за непрекъснато учене за проследяване на състоянието на диалога в сравнение с най-съвременните базови линии.', 'hr': 'Željni dijalogski sustav mora biti u stanju nastaviti naučiti nove vještine bez zaboravljanja starih i tako se prilagodi novim domenama ili zadatkima u svom životnom ciklusu. Međutim, stalno obučavanje model a često vodi do poznatog katastrofskog zaboravljanja pitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo kontinualnu prompt prilagodbu, parametrijski okvir koji ne samo izbjegava zaboravljanje, nego i omogućava prenošenje znanja između zadataka. Za izbjegavanje zaboravljanja, naučimo i čuvamo samo nekoliko brzog znakova za svaki zadatak dok smrzavamo predobučeni model leđa kosti. Da bismo postigli dvosmjernu prijenos znanja među zadacima, predlažemo nekoliko tehnika (stalna brza inicijalizacija, ispitivanje fuzije i ponovno ispitivanje sjećanja) premještaju znanja iz prethodnih zadataka i tehnike vodjene na pamćenje premještaju znanja iz sljedećih zadataka. Prošireni eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost i učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda o kontinualnom učenju za praćenje država dijaloga u usporedbi s početnim linijama stanja umjetnosti.', 'da': 'Et ønskeligt dialogsystem bør løbende kunne lære nye færdigheder uden at glemme gamle og dermed tilpasse sig nye områder eller opgaver i sin livscyklus. Men løbende træning af en model fører ofte til et velkendt katastrofalt glemmeproblem. I denne artikel præsenterer vi Continual Prompt Tuning, en parametereffektiv ramme, der ikke blot undgår at glemme, men også muliggør vidensoverførsel mellem opgaver. For at undgå at glemme, lærer og gemmer vi kun et par prompt tokens indlejringer til hver opgave, mens vi fryser rygraden forudtrænet model. For at opnå tovejet vidensoverførsel mellem opgaver foreslår vi flere teknikker (kontinuerlig prompt initialisering, forespørgselsfunktion og hukommelse replay) til at overføre viden fra tidligere opgaver og en hukommelse-guidet teknik til at overføre viden fra efterfølgende opgaver. Omfattende eksperimenter viser effektiviteten og effektiviteten af vores foreslåede metode til kontinuerlig læring til dialog state tracking sammenlignet med state-of-the-art baselines.', 'nl': 'Een wenselijk dialoogsysteem moet voortdurend nieuwe vaardigheden kunnen leren zonder de oude te vergeten, en zich daardoor kunnen aanpassen aan nieuwe domeinen of taken in zijn levenscyclus. Het voortdurend trainen van een model leidt echter vaak tot een bekend catastrofal vergeten probleem. In dit artikel presenteren we Continual Prompt Tuning, een parameter-efficiënt framework dat niet alleen vergeet, maar ook kennisoverdracht tussen taken mogelijk maakt. Om te voorkomen dat we vergeten, leren en bewaren we slechts een paar prompt tokens embeddings voor elke taak terwijl we het backbone voorgetrainde model bevriezen. Om bi-directionele kennisoverdracht tussen taken te bereiken, stellen we verschillende technieken voor (continue prompt initialisatie, query fusion en memory replay) om kennis over te dragen van voorgaande taken en een geheugengestuurde techniek om kennis over te dragen van latere taken. Uitgebreide experimenten demonstreren de effectiviteit en efficiëntie van onze voorgestelde methode voor continue leren voor dialoogstatus tracking, vergeleken met state-of-the-art baselines.', 'de': 'Ein wünschenswertes Dialogsystem sollte in der Lage sein, ständig neue Fähigkeiten zu erlernen, ohne alte zu vergessen und sich dadurch an neue Bereiche oder Aufgaben in seinem Lebenszyklus anzupassen. Die kontinuierliche Ausbildung eines Modells führt jedoch oft zu einem bekannten katastrophalen Vergessensproblem. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Continual Prompt Tuning vor, ein parametereffizientes Framework, das nicht nur Vergessen vermeidet, sondern auch Wissenstransfer zwischen Aufgaben ermöglicht. Um nicht zu vergessen, lernen und speichern wir für jede Aufgabe nur ein paar Prompt-Tokens, während wir das Backbone-vortrainierte Modell einfrieren. Um einen bidirektionalen Wissenstransfer zwischen Aufgaben zu erreichen, schlagen wir verschiedene Techniken (kontinuierliche Prompt Initialisierung, Abfragefusion und Speicherwiedergabe) vor, um Wissen aus vorhergehenden Aufgaben zu übertragen und eine speichergesteuerte Technik zum Transfer von Wissen aus nachfolgenden Aufgaben. Umfangreiche Experimente demonstrieren die Effektivität und Effizienz unserer vorgeschlagenen Methode zum kontinuierlichen Lernen für Dialogzustandsverfolgung im Vergleich zu State-of-the-Art Baselines.', 'ko': '이상적인 대화 시스템은 낡은 기술을 잊지 않고 새로운 기술을 끊임없이 배워서 그의 생명 주기 중의 새로운 영역이나 임무에 적응할 수 있어야 한다.그러나 하나의 모델을 지속적으로 훈련하는 것은 흔히 모두가 알고 있는 재난적인 망각 문제를 초래할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 지속적인 제시 조정을 제시했다. 이것은 매개 변수의 효과적인 구조로 잊어버리는 것을 피할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 임무 간의 지식 이동도 실현할 수 있다.잊어버리는 것을 피하기 위해 우리는 모든 임무의 몇 가지 알림 표시만 배우고 저장하며 주요 훈련 모델을 동결한다.임무 간의 쌍방향 지식 이동을 실현하기 위해 우리는 몇 가지 기술(연속 제시 초기화, 조회 융합과 기억 재생)을 제시하여 이전 임무의 지식을 옮기고 기억 유도 기술로 다음 임무의 지식을 옮긴다.대량의 실험을 통해 가장 선진적인 기선에 비해 우리가 제시한 방법은 대화 상태 추적의 지속적인 학습에 효과적이고 효율적이라는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'id': "Sistem dialog yang diinginkan seharusnya dapat terus-menerus belajar keterampilan baru tanpa melupakan keterampilan lama, dan dengan itu beradaptasi dengan domain atau tugas baru dalam siklus hidupnya. Namun, pelatihan terus menerus model sering mengarah ke masalah melupakan bencana yang terkenal. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan Penyesuaian Terus Prompt, rangkaian yang efisien parameter yang tidak hanya menghindari melupakan tetapi juga memungkinkan transfer pengetahuan antara tugas. Untuk menghindari melupakan, kita hanya belajar dan menyimpan beberapa token 'embedding untuk setiap tugas sementara membeku model pre-terlatih tulang belakang. Untuk mencapai transfer pengetahuan bidireksi diantara tugas, kami mengusulkan beberapa teknik (inisialisasi prompt terus menerus, pertanyaan fusi, dan permainan ulang ingatan) untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari tugas sebelumnya dan teknik memory-guided untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari tugas berikutnya. Eksperimen ekstensif menunjukkan efektivitas dan efisiensi metode kami yang diusulkan untuk belajar terus menerus untuk pelacakan keadaan dialog, dibandingkan dengan garis dasar state-of-the-art.", 'sw': 'Mfumo wa mazungumzo yanapaswa kuwa na uwezo wa kujifunza ujuzi mpya bila ya kusahau wazee wa zamani, na kwa hiyo huchanganya na maeneo mapya au kazi katika mzunguko wake wa maisha. Hata hivyo, kuendelea kufundisha muundo mara nyingi hupelekea tatizo linalofahamika sana la kusahau suala hili. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka madai ya kuendelea kuendelea kuandika, mfumo wenye ufanisi ambao si tu unajitenga na kusahau lakini pia inawezesha kusambaza maarifa kati ya kazi. Ili kuepuka kusahau, tunajifunza na kuhifadhia ishara chache za haraka kwa kila kazi wakati tunavua mifano ya mafunzo ya mgongo. Ili kupata mabadiliko ya maarifa ya moja kwa moja kati ya kazi, tunapendekeza mbinu kadhaa (mwanzo wa haraka, kutafuta fujo, na jibu la kumbukumbu) kuhamisha maarifa kutoka katika kazi zilizopita na teknolojia inayoongozwa kwa kumbukumbu ili kubadilisha maarifa kutoka kazi za baadae. Majaribio mengi yanaonyesha ufanisi na ufanisi wa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa kuendelea kujifunza kwa ajili ya ufuatiliaji wa serikali wa mazungumzo, ukilinganisha na misingi ya hali ya sanaa.', 'fa': 'یک سیستم گفتگوی خواسته باید قادر به همیشه مهارت جدید یاد بگیرد بدون فراموش کردن پیرمردان، و بدین\u200cسان به دامنه\u200cهای جدید یا وظیفه\u200cهایی در طول زندگی خود adapt کنید. با این حال، همیشه آموزش یک مدل اغلب به یک مشکل فراموش کننده\u200cی فاجعه\u200cای شناخته می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچوب موثر پارامتر را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نه تنها از فراموش کردن فراموش می\u200cکند بلکه همچنین به انتقال علم بین وظیفه\u200cها اجازه می\u200cدهد. تا از فراموش کردن فراموش کنیم، ما فقط چند تا نشانه\u200cهای پیش آموزشی را برای هر کاری یاد می\u200cگیریم و نگه می\u200cداریم در حالی که مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزشی پشت استخوان را سرد می\u200cکنیم. برای رسیدن انتقال علم دو مسیر بین وظیفه\u200cها، چندین تکنیک پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم (آغاز کردن همیشه، ترکیب جستجو و بازیابی حافظه) تا علم را از وظیفه\u200cهای پیشینی و تکنیک هدایت یادآوری برای انتقال علم از وظیفه\u200cهای بعد انتقال کند. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای موثرت و موثرت روش پیشنهاد ما را در مورد یادگیری دائمی برای ردیابی دولتی محاورش نشان می\u200cدهد، در مقایسه با خطوط\u200cهای پایین\u200cهنری.', 'tr': 'Garry adamlary unutmadan täze bir dialog sistemasy täze ukyplary öwrenip biler we onuň üçin täze alanlary ýa-da durmuşynyň döneginde täze ukyplary üýtgetmeli. Ýöne daşary bir nusga öwrenmek köplenç tanaýan bir katastrofýan ýatdan çykarmak meselene çevrilýär. Bu kagyzda, biz daşary soraglamak üçin, parameterlik etkinlik bir çerçewde şuny ýatdan çykarmakdan çykarýan däl, ýöne bilim işleri arasynda hereket etmäge mümkin edýäris. Unutmakdan çykmak üçin, biz diňe birnäçe teker işi üçin öwrenýäk we ýene-de öwrenmäk üçin arka süňekli nusgasyny buz edip goýýarys. Görevleriň arasynda ikinji görnüş bilim aktarmasyna ýetmek üçin birnäçe teknikleri (daşary başlatmak, üýtgetmek we paýat koplamak üçin) bilgileri öňki görevlerden geçirmek üçin we bir yada kadalýan teknikini soňky görerlerden geçirmek üçin teknikleri tekniýe berýäris. Döwlet durumlary gözlemäge daýat öwrenmek üçin biziň teklip eden metodamyzyň etkinlik we etkinlik barlygyny görkez.', 'sq': 'Një sistem dialog i dëshirueshëm duhet të jetë në gjendje të mësojë vazhdimisht aftësi të reja pa harruar aftësitë e vjetra dhe kështu të përshtatet në fusha apo detyra të reja në ciklin e jetës së tij. Megjithatë, trajnimi i vazhdueshëm i një modeli shpesh çon në një çështje të njohur të harrimit katastrofik. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim Tuning të vazhdueshëm të nxitur, një kuadër parametrash-efikas që jo vetëm shmangë harrimin por gjithashtu lejon transferimin e njohurive midis detyrave. Për të shmangur harrimin, ne vetëm mësojmë dhe ruajmë disa emra të shpejtë për çdo detyrë ndërsa ngrijmë modelin e paratrajnuar. Për të arritur transferimin e njohurive dy-drejtues midis detyrave, ne propozojmë disa teknika (inicializim të vazhdueshëm të shpejtë, fusion i kërkimit dhe riprodhim i kujtesës) për të transferuar njohuritë nga detyrat e mëparshme dhe një teknikë të drejtuar nga kujtesa për të transferuar njohuritë nga detyrat e mëparshme. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara tregojnë efektshmërinë dhe efektshmërinë e metodës sonë të propozuar për mësimin e vazhdueshëm për gjurmimin e gjendjes së dialogut, krahasuar me linjat bazë më të larta.', 'af': "'n Gelukkige dialoog stelsel moet wees in staat om nuwe kunstenaars te leer sonder om oue kunstenaars te vergeet en daarmee aan nuwe domeine of opdragte in sy lewe syklus te pas. Maar voortdurende onderwerp van 'n model het dikwels na 'n goed bekende katastrofe vergeet probleem. In hierdie papier, laat ons voorsien Continual Prompt Tuning, 'n parameter-effektief raamwerk wat nie net vergeet nie, maar ook kennis oordrag tussen taak toelaat. Om te vergeet nie, ons leer en stoor slegs 'n paar prompt tokens se inbêdings vir elke taak terwyl ons die agterbêne voor- opgelei model frees. Om bi-rigting kennis oordrag onder opdragte te bereik, voorstel ons verskeie teknike (voortdurende prompt aanvang, navraag fuisie en geheue herhaal) om kennis te oordrag van vooraf opdragte en 'n geheue-gidde teknike om kennis te oordrag van volgende opdragte. Ekstensiewe eksperimente wys die effektiviteit en effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde metode op voortdurende leer vir dialoog staatstracking, vergelyk met staat van die kuns basisline.", 'am': "አሮጌዎችን ሳይረሳ አዲስ እውቀት ማርቅ የሚችል የጥያቄ ጥያቄ ስርዓት እና በሕይወት ሳክስል አዲስ አዲስ ሀገሮች ወይም ሥርዓቶችን ማግኘት ይገባዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን ዘወትር ሞዴል በብዙ ጊዜ የሚታወቀው የጥፋት ጉዳይ ይሄዳል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የዘወትር ፕሮጀክት ማቀናጃ፣ በሥርዓት መካከል እውቀትን ለመለወጥ ብቻ ሳይረሳው የሚችል አካባቢ ፍሬም እናቀርባለን፡፡ To avoid forgetting, we only learn and store a few prompt tokens' embeddings for each task while freezing the backbone pre-trained model.  ወደ ስራዎች መቀላቀል እና ማስታወቂያ ለመቀበል፣ እውቀትን ከቀድሞው ስራቶች እና ማስታወሻ ተመራጭ ስህተት ለመለወጥ (ሁልጊዜ መጀመሪያ፣ ማስታወስ ስራ እና ማስታወሻ መልስ) እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ ብዙዎች ፈተናዎች የጥያቄ እና ጥቃቃዊ ጥያቄን በማስተማር የጥያቄ ሥርዓት የመስመር ግንኙነት ላይ እና ጥያቄን እና ጥያቄን በማስታወቂያው ነው፡፡", 'hy': 'A desirable dialog system should be able to continually learn new skills without forgetting old ones, and thereby adapt to new domains or tasks in its life cycle.  Այնուամենայնիվ, շարունակական մոդելը հաճախ հանգեցնում է հայտնի կոտրոֆիկ մոռանալու խնդիր: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք անընդհատ արագ հարմարեցման մի պարամետրերի արդյունավետ շրջանակ, որը ոչ միայն խուսափում է մոռանալուց, այլ նաև հնարավորություն է տալիս գիտելիքների փոխանցումը առաջադրանքների միջև: Որպեսզի խուսափենք մոռանալու, մենք սովորում ենք և պահպանում մի քանի արագ նշանների ներդրումներ յուրաքանչյուր խնդրի համար, սառելով նախապատրաստված մոդելը: Երկու ուղղությամբ տեղափոխելու համար մեր առաջադրանքների միջև մենք առաջարկում ենք մի քանի տեխնիկա (շարունակական արագ ինիցիալիզացիա, հարցումներ համալսարան և հիշողության վերադարձում) տեղափոխելու համար գիտելիքը նախորդ առաջադրանքներից և հիշողությամբ ուղղությա Մեծ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկված մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը և արդյունավետությունը շարունակական ուսումնասիրության համար վիճակի հետևելու համար, համեմատած ամենաբարձր հիմքերի հետ:', 'bn': 'একটি প্রয়োজনীয় ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম বুড়দের ভুলে যাওয়া ছাড়াই সবসময় নতুন দক্ষতা শিখতে পারে এবং এর ফলে তার জীবন সাইকেলে নতুন ডোমেন তবে সবসময় একটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রায়শ পরিচিত বিপর্যয়ের কারণে ভুলে যায়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা অনলাইন প্রমোক্ট ট টিউনিং উপস্থাপন করছি, একটি প্যারামিটার-কার্যকর কাঠামো যা ভুলে যাওয়া শুধুমাত্র ভুলে যায় না, কিন্তু  ভুলে যাওয়ার জন্য, আমরা শুধু প্রত্যেক কাজের জন্য কিছু দ্রুত চিহ্ন সংরক্ষণ করতে শিখি এবং সংরক্ষণ করতে পারি পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল ঠা কাজের মধ্যে সরাসরি জ্ঞান পরিবর্তনের জন্য আমরা বেশ কিছু প্রযুক্তি প্রস্তাব করছি (বেশ কিছু প্রযুক্তি প্রাথমিকভাবে প্রথম কাজ, অনুসন্ধান এবং মেমোরি প্রতিক্রিয়া) এবং পরবর বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যকর এবং কার্যকর প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যাতে ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্রের ট্র্যাকিং এর জন্য চ', 'bs': 'Željni dijalogski sistem bi trebao biti u stanju stalno naučiti nove vještine bez zaboravljanja starih, i tako se prilagodi novim domenama ili zadatkima u svom životnom ciklusu. Međutim, stalno obučavanje model a često vodi do poznatog katastrofskog zaboravljanja pitanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo kontinualnu prometnu prilagodbu, parametrijski okvir koji ne samo izbjegava zaboravljanje, nego i omogućava prenošenje znanja između zadataka. Da bismo izbjegli zaboravljanje, naučili smo i čuvali samo nekoliko brzog znakova za svaki zadatak dok zamrzavamo predobučeni model leđa. Da bismo postigli dvosmjernu prijenos znanja među zadacima, predlažemo nekoliko tehnika (stalna brza inicijalizacija, pitanje fuzije i ponovno uspomene) da prenesu znanje iz prethodnih zadataka i tehnika vodjene na pamćenje da prenese znanja iz sljedećih zadataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost i učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda o kontinualnom učenju za praćenje država dijaloga u usporedbi s državnim osnovnim linijama umjetnosti.', 'az': "İstədiyi dialoq sistemi köhnüləri unutmadan yeni yeteneklikləri öyrənə bilər və bununla onun həyat dönüşündə yeni domenalara və işlərə uyğun olmalıdır. Ancaq bir modeli təhsil etmək sık-sıq tanınmış bir katastrofi unutmaq məqsədilə yol a çar. Bu kağızda, həmişəlik Prompt Tuning'i göstərdik, parametr-effektiv bir çerçive, yalnız unutmaqdan çəkinməkdən çəkinməkdən və həmçinin bilim işləri arasında keçirməsini mümkün edər. Unutmaqdan çəkinmək üçün, biz yalnız bir neçə tələsirli möcüzələri öyrəndik və hər işin içərisində tədriclə öyrəndik. İkinci yönəlik bilgi göndərməsi üçün, öyrəndikləri işlərdən bilgi və sonrakı işlərdən elmi göndərmək üçün bir neçə tekniki (sürəkli tələb başlatmaq, fəsad tələb etmək və yaddaş tələb etmək üçün) təklif edirik. Müxtəlif təcrübələrimiz dəyişdirilmiş metodumuzun sürəkli öyrənməsi ilə dəyişdirilməsini göstərir.", 'cs': 'Žádoucí dialogový systém by měl být schopen neustále učit se nové dovednosti, aniž by zapomněl na staré, a tím by se měl přizpůsobit novým oblastem nebo úkolům ve svém životním cyklu. Neustálé trénování modelu však často vede k dobře známému katastrofickému zapomenutí. V tomto článku představujeme Continual Prompt Tuning, parametrově efektivní rámec, který nejen zapomíná, ale také umožňuje přenos znalostí mezi úkoly. Abychom zabránili zapomenutí, učíme se a ukládáme pouze několik výzvě vložených tokenů pro každý úkol a zatímco zmrazíme páteřní předtrénovaný model. Pro dosažení obousměrného přenosu znalostí mezi úkoly navrhujeme několik technik (kontinuální inicializace výzvy, fúze dotazů a přehrávání paměti) pro přenos znalostí z předchozích úkolů a paměťově řízenou techniku pro přenos znalostí z následujících úkolů. Rozsáhlé experimenty demonstrují efektivitu a efektivitu naší navrhované metody kontinuálního učení pro sledování dialogového stavu ve srovnání s nejmodernějšími základními liniemi.', 'ca': "Un sistema de diàleg desitjable hauria de ser capaç d'aprendre continuament noves habilitats sense oblidar de les velles, adaptant-se així a nous dominis o tasques en el seu cicle de vida. Tanmateix, l'entrenament continu d'un model sovint porta a un problema d'oblida catastròfica conegut. In this paper, we present Continual Prompt Tuning, a parameter-efficient framework that not only avoids forgetting but also enables knowledge transfer between tasks.  To avoid forgetting, we only learn and store a few prompt tokens' embeddings for each task while freezing the backbone pre-trained model.  Per aconseguir una transfer ència de coneixements bidireccionals entre tasques, proposem diverses tècniques (inicialització ràpida continua, fusió de preguntes i reproducció de memòria) per transferir coneixements de tasques anteriors i una tècnica guiada per la memòria per transferir coneixements de tasques posteriors. Els extensos experiments demostren l'eficiència i l'eficiència del nostre mètode proposat en l'aprenentatge continua per a seguir l'estat del diàleg, comparat amb les línies de base més avançades.", 'et': "Soovitav dialoogisüsteem peaks suutma pidevalt õppida uusi oskusi vanu unustamata ning seeläbi kohaneda uute valdkondade või ülesannetega oma elutsüklis. Kuid mudeli pidev koolitamine viib sageli tuntud katastroofilise unustamise probleemini. Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame Continual Prompt Tuning'i, parameetrite tõhusat raamistikku, mis mitte ainult ei väldi unustamist, vaid võimaldab ka teadmiste edastamist ülesannete vahel. Unustamise vältimiseks õpime ja salvestame iga ülesande jaoks ainult mõned kiired tokenid, külmutades selgroo eeltreenitud mudeli. Kahesuunalise teadmussiirde saavutamiseks ülesannete vahel pakume välja mitmeid tehnikaid (pidev kiire initsialiseerimine, päringute ühendamine ja mälu kordamine), et edastada teadmisi eelnevatest ülesannetest ja mälu-juhendatud tehnikat teadmiste edastamiseks järgmistest ülesannetest. Laiaulatuslikud eksperimendid näitavad meie pakutud meetodi efektiivsust ja efektiivsust dialoogi seisundi jälgimiseks pideva õppimise meetodil, võrreldes kaasaegsete lähtejoontega.", 'fi': 'Toivottavan vuoropuhelujärjestelmän pitäisi pystyä jatkuvasti oppimaan uusia taitoja unohtamatta vanhoja taitoja ja siten sopeutumaan uusiin osa-alueisiin tai tehtäviin elinkaaressaan. Mallin jatkuva kouluttaminen johtaa kuitenkin usein tunnettuun katastrofaaliseen unohtamiseen. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme Jatkuva Prompt Tuning -järjestelmän, joka on parametritehokas kehys, joka paitsi välttää unohtamisen myös mahdollistaa tiedonsiirron tehtävien välillä. Unohtumisen välttämiseksi opimme ja tallennamme vain muutaman prompt polettien upotukset jokaista tehtävää varten jäädyttäessämme selkärangan valmiiksi koulutetun mallin. Kaksisuuntaisen tiedonsiirron aikaansaamiseksi tehtävien välillä ehdotamme useita tekniikoita (jatkuva pikakäynnistys, kyselyfuusio ja muistin toisto) tiedon siirtämiseksi aikaisemmista tehtävistä ja muistiohjattua tekniikkaa tiedon siirtämiseksi myöhemmistä tehtävistä. Laajat kokeet osoittavat ehdotetun menetelmän tehokkuuden ja tehokkuuden dialogin tilan seurantaan verrattuna viimeisimpiin lähtölinjoihin.', 'jv': 'Danyabuk sistem sing wis dipoleh hayo kanggo ngulinakake kapan anyar sampeyan ngulinakake tho, lan ngaksudo sampeyan kanggo sabên winih sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo mbanjurakno Nanging, njuk-njuk sekolah sistem sing dikarepaké model sing dikondisih sedhaya kang alam-alam kuwi mau. In this paper, we present kontinual So that\'s all To success politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'מערכת דיאלוג רצויה צריכה להיות מסוגלת ללמוד כישורים חדשים ללא שכחת כישורים ישנים, ולכן להתאים לתחומים או משימות חדשים במחזור החיים שלה. עם זאת, אימונים ממשיכים מודל לעתים קרובות מובילים לבעיה קטסטרופית ידועה לשכוח. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את התרגיל הקידום הממשיך, מסגר יעיל לפרמטרים שלא רק מתחמק לשכוח, אלא גם מאפשר העברת ידע בין משימות. כדי להימנע לשכוח, אנחנו לומדים ולחסן רק כמה סימנים מהירים של כל משימה בזמן הקפיא את המודל המאמן מראש בעצם הגב. כדי להשיג העברת ידע שתי כיוונים בין המשימות, אנו מציעים כמה טכניקות (התחלה מיידית ממשיכה, התמזמזות מבקש, ושוב זיכרון) כדי להעביר ידע ממשימות קודמות וטכניקה מונחת בזיכרון להעביר ידע ממשימות אחר כך. ניסויים רחבים מראים את היעילות והיעילות של השיטה המוצעת שלנו על הלימודים המשיכים לאתר מדיום דיאלוג, בהשוואה לקווי הבסיס המאוחרים.', 'ha': "Wata tsari na zauren akwatin bayani ya kamata ya iya iya amfani da kara koda, idan ba ya manta gamuwa na farko ba, kuma ya daidai da kwamfyuta guda ko aikin aiki a cikin ƙarshen rãyuwarsa. A lokacin da yake yin amfani da misãlin a daidai, ko da yawa yana ƙara zuwa wani matsayi mai baya da aka sani. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da shirin Cikakken Fara Fasa, firam mai Effekt da ke iya karatun, kuma bã ya barin mantawa kawai kuma yana iya yarda da transfer ilmi a tsakanin aikin. Ji gudu da mantawa, za'a sanar da mu kuma mu adana kodi masu cikin ayukan ayukan da aka ƙayyade wa kowace aikin da za'a kulle misãlin da aka yi wa zaman wa-gyare. To, in sãmu transfer kunnuwa na guda da shiryarwa daga aikin aiki, sai mu buƙata masu shiryuwa (fara-fara fara-fara, tambayar fusarwa, da tambayar ƙõnuwa da kuma rabo tunãtarwa) zuwa a motsa zane daga aikin da aka gabatar da kuma a kan jerin da aka shiryar da shi zuwa aikin bayan. Akwai jarrabo masu ƙaranci sun nuna aikin da akan da fassarar hanyenmu na buƙata a kan karatun da ake yi wa zauren akwatin bayani na state-of-art.", 'sk': 'Zaželeni dialogni sistem bi moral biti sposoben nenehno učiti nove veščine, ne da bi pozabili na stare, in se s tem prilagoditi novim področjem ali nalogam v svojem življenjskem ciklu. Vendar pa nenehno usposabljanje modela pogosto vodi v dobro znano katastrofalno vprašanje pozabljanja. V prispevku predstavljamo kontinuirano uglaševanje prometa, okvir z učinkovitostjo parametrov, ki ne le preprečuje pozabljanja, temveč omogoča prenos znanja med nalogami. Da bi se izognili pozabi, se za vsako opravilo naučimo in shranimo le nekaj vdelanih žetonov, medtem ko zamrznemo hrbtenico predhodno usposobljenega modela. Za doseganje dvosmernega prenosa znanja med nalogami predlagamo več tehnik (nenehna hitra inicializacija, fuzija poizvedb in ponovni predvajanje spomina) za prenos znanja iz predhodnih nalog in spominsko vodeno tehniko za prenos znanja iz naslednjih nalog. Obsežni eksperimenti dokazujejo učinkovitost in učinkovitost naše predlagane metode stalnega učenja za spremljanje stanja dialoga v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi osnovnimi linijami.', 'bo': 'A desirable dialog system should be able to continuously learn new skills without forgetting old ones, and thereby adapt to new domains or tasks in its life cycle. ཡིན་ནའང་། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱིས་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དུ་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྟོན་པའི་དོན་ In this paper, we present Continual Prompt Tuning, a parameter-efficient framework that not only avoids forgetting but also enables knowledge transfer between tasks. དེ་ལས་བརྗེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྟོང་རྗེས་སུ་གཏོང་དགོས། To achieve bi-directional knowledge transfer among tasks, we propose several techniques (continual prompt initialization, query fusion, and memory replay) to transfer knowledge from preceding tasks and a memory-guided technique to transfer knowledge from subsequent tasks. Extensive experiments demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of our proposed method on continual learning for dialog state tracking, compared with state-of-the-art baselines.'}
{'en': 'Educational Question Generation of Children Storybooks via Question Type Distribution Learning and Event-centric Summarization', 'ar': 'هناك وقت ومكان للتفكير وراء الصورة', 'es': 'Hay un momento y un lugar para razonar más allá de la imagen', 'pt': 'Há um tempo e um lugar para raciocinar além da imagem', 'fr': "Il y a un moment et un lieu pour raisonner au-delà de l'image", 'ja': '画像を超えた推理の時間と場所があります', 'hi': 'छवि से परे तर्क के लिए एक समय और स्थान है', 'zh': '有一个时间和地点越过图像的推理', 'ru': 'Есть время и место для рассуждений за пределами образа', 'ga': 'Tá Am agus Áit le Réasúnú Thar an Íomhá', 'ka': 'თმა გპვმვ თ მვჟრჲ ჱა პაჱოჲლჱგანვ ჲრ ჟნთმკარა.', 'hu': 'Van idő és hely az érvelésnek a képen túl', 'el': 'Υπάρχει χρόνος και τόπος λογικής πέρα από την εικόνα', 'lt': 'Yra laikas ir vieta už paveikslėlio', 'it': "C'è un tempo e un luogo per ragionare oltre l'immagine", 'kk': 'Кескіннің артында себептердің уақыты мен орналасуы бар', 'mk': 'Има време и место за размислување надвор од сликата', 'ml': 'ചിത്രത്തിനു പുറത്തുള്ള ഒരു സമയവും സ്ഥലമുണ്ട്', 'mn': 'Зурагийн дотор шалтгаан болон орон зай байдаг.', 'mt': 'Hemm Ħin u Post għal Raġunar lil hinn mill-Immaġni', 'no': 'Det finst ein tid og plass for å forståra bort biletet', 'ms': 'Ada Masa dan Tempat untuk Menyebabkan Diluar Imej', 'pl': 'Jest czas i miejsce na rozumowanie poza obrazem', 'ro': 'Există un timp și un loc pentru a raționa dincolo de imagine', 'sr': 'Postoji vremena i mesto za razloge izvan slike', 'si': 'පින්තූරය පිටිපස්සේ හේතුව සඳහා වෙලාව සහ තැනක් තියෙනවා', 'sv': 'Det finns en tid och plats för resonemang bortom bilden', 'ur': 'تصویر کے آگے ایک وقت اور جگہ ہے', 'so': 'Waxaa jirta waqti iyo goor la sameynayo sawirka ka sokow', 'ta': 'பிம்பத்திற்குப் புறத்திற்கு வாங்குவதற்கு ஒரு நேரம் மற்றும் இடம் உள்ளது', 'vi': 'Có một khoảng thời gian và nơi lý giải vượt ra khỏi Ảnh', 'uz': 'Rasmning yonida olish uchun vaqt va joyi mavjud', 'bg': 'Има време и място за разсъждаване отвъд образа', 'da': 'Der er et tidspunkt og et sted at begrunde sig ud over billedet', 'nl': 'Er is een tijd en plaats voor redeneren voorbij het beeld', 'de': 'Es gibt Zeit und Ort für Vernunft jenseits des Bildes', 'id': 'Ada waktu dan tempat untuk alasan di luar gambar', 'hr': 'Postoji vremena i mjesto za razloge izvan slike', 'ko': '영상 외에도 시간과 장소에서 추리를 진행할 수 있다', 'fa': 'زمان و جایی برای دلایل بیرون تصویر وجود دارد', 'tr': 'Resimden öňünde sebäplik üçin wagt we ýer bar', 'sw': 'Kuna muda na mahali kwa ajili ya Kujiandaa nje ya Picha', 'af': "Daar is 'n tyd en plek vir rede buite die beeld", 'sq': 'Ka një kohë dhe vend për arsyetimin përtej imazhit', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'hy': "There's a Time and Place for Reasoning Beyond the Image", 'az': 'Görüntüyün önündə haqq-hesab üçün vaxt və yer var', 'bn': 'ছবির পাশের প্রতিক্রিয়ার জন্য একটি সময় ও জায়গা আছে', 'bs': 'Postoji vremena i mjesto za razloge izvan slike', 'ca': 'Hi ha un lloc i temps de raonament més enllà de la imatge', 'fi': 'On aika ja paikka järkeilylle kuvan takana', 'cs': 'Existuje čas a místo pro rozumování mimo obraz', 'et': 'On aeg ja koht mõistmiseks väljaspool pilti', 'jv': 'Ora ana Oran lan dakaan kebebasan luwih-luwih Gambar', 'he': 'יש זמן ומקום להסביר מעבר לתמונה', 'sk': 'Obstaja čas in kraj za razumevanje onkraj slike', 'ha': 'Ana da wani lokaci da Wurin Fara Zanen', 'bo': 'བརྙན་རིས་ཕྱོགས་ཏུ་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་དུས་དང་སྐབས་གནས་ཡུལ་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Generating educational questions of fairytales or storybooks is vital for improving children’s literacy ability. However, it is challenging to generate questions that capture the interesting aspects of a fairytale story with educational meaningfulness. In this paper, we propose a novel question generation method that first learns the question type distribution of an input story paragraph, and then summarizes salient events which can be used to generate high-cognitive-demand questions. To train the event-centric summarizer, we finetune a pre-trained transformer-based sequence-to-sequence model using silver samples composed by educational question-answer pairs. On a newly proposed educational question-answering dataset FairytaleQA, we show good performance of our method on both automatic and human evaluation metrics. Our work indicates the necessity of decomposing question type distribution learning and event-centric summary generation for educational question generation.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تكون الصور أكثر أهمية من البيكسلات فقط لعيون الإنسان ، حيث يمكننا الاستدلال على المعلومات السياقية من مصادر أخرى وربطها والتعليل بها لإنشاء صورة أكثر اكتمالاً. على سبيل المثال ، في الشكل 1 ، يمكننا العثور على طريقة لتحديد المقالات الإخبارية المتعلقة بالصورة من خلال الفهم الجزئي للعلامات والمباني والحشود والمزيد. يمكن أن يوفر هذا المنطق الوقت والمكان الذي تم التقاط الصورة فيه ، مما سيساعدنا في المهام اللاحقة ، مثل إنشاء قصة تلقائيًا ، وتصحيح مصدر الصورة في صور التأثير المقصود ، ومعالجة التدفق العلوي مثل تجميع الصور لموقع أو وقت معين .\n\nفي هذا العمل ، نصوغ هذه المشكلة ونقدم TARA: مجموعة بيانات تحتوي على 16 ألف صورة مع الأخبار والوقت والموقع المرتبطة بها ، المستخرجة تلقائيًا من New York Times ، وأمثلة إضافية بـ 61 ألفًا كإشراف بعيد من فريق WIT. علاوة على عمليات الاستخراج ، نقدم مجموعة فرعية من التعهيد الجماعي نعتقد فيها أنه من الممكن العثور على المعلومات المكانية والزمانية للصور لغرض التقييم. نظهر أن هناك فجوة بقيمة $ 70 \\٪ $ بين النموذج المشترك الحديث والأداء البشري ، والتي تم ملؤها قليلاً من خلال نموذجنا المقترح الذي يستخدم المنطق الجزئي ، مما يحفز النماذج المشتركة بين الرؤية واللغة عالية المستوى يمكنه إجراء تفكير مفتوح مع معرفة العالم.\nالبيانات والكود متاحان للجمهور على https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA.', 'fr': "Les images sont souvent plus significatives que les seuls pixels pour l'œil humain, car nous pouvons déduire, associer et raisonner avec des informations contextuelles provenant d'autres sources pour obtenir une image plus complète. Par exemple, dans la Figure 1, nous pouvons trouver un moyen d'identifier les articles de presse liés à l'image grâce à une compréhension segmentée des panneaux, des bâtiments, de la foule, etc. Ce raisonnement peut fournir l'heure et le lieu où l'image a été prise, ce qui nous aidera dans les tâches suivantes, telles que la construction automatique du scénario, la correction de la source de l'image dans les photographies à effets souhaités et le traitement en amont tel que le regroupement d'images pour un endroit ou une heure donnés.\n\nDans ce travail, nous formulons ce problème et introduisons TARA\xa0: un ensemble de données avec 16k images avec leurs actualités, heure et lieu associés, extraits automatiquement du New York Times, et 61 000 exemples supplémentaires sous forme de supervision à distance depuis WIT. En plus des extractions, nous présentons un sous-ensemble participatif dans lequel nous pensons qu'il est possible de trouver les informations spatio-temporelles des images à des fins d'évaluation. Nous montrons qu'il existe un écart de 70$\xa0\\ %$ entre un modèle conjoint de pointe et la performance humaine, qui est légèrement comblé par notre modèle proposé qui utilise un raisonnement segmenté, motivant des modèles conjoints de langage de vision de haut niveau capables de mener un raisonnement ouvert avec une connaissance du monde.\nLes données et le code sont accessibles au public à l'adresse https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA.", 'es': 'Las imágenes suelen ser más significativas que solo los píxeles para los ojos humanos, ya que podemos inferir, asociar y razonar con información contextual de otras fuentes para establecer una imagen más completa. Por ejemplo, en la Figura 1, podemos encontrar una manera de identificar los artículos de noticias relacionados con la imagen a través de la comprensión de los segmentos de los letreros, los edificios, las multitudes y más. Este razonamiento podría proporcionar la hora y el lugar en que se tomó la imagen, lo que nos ayudará en las tareas posteriores, como la construcción automática de la historia, la corrección de la fuente de la imagen en las fotografías con efectos deseados y el procesamiento ascendente, como el agrupamiento de imágenes para una determinada ubicación o tiempo.\n\nEn este trabajo, formulamos este problema e introducimos TARA: un conjunto de datos con 16k imágenes con sus noticias, hora y ubicación asociadas, extraídas automáticamente del New York Times, y 61.000 ejemplos adicionales como supervisión a distancia de WIT. Además de las extracciones, presentamos un subconjunto colaborativo en el que creemos que es posible encontrar la información espacio-temporal de las imágenes con fines de evaluación. Demostramos que existe una brecha de $70\\% $ entre un modelo conjunto de última generación y el rendimiento humano, que se llena ligeramente con nuestro modelo propuesto que utiliza el razonamiento por segmentos, motivando modelos conjuntos de visión y lenguaje de nivel superior que pueden llevar a cabo un razonamiento abierto con conocimiento mundial.\nLos datos y el código están disponibles públicamente en https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA.', 'pt': 'As imagens são muitas vezes mais significativas do que apenas os pixels para os olhos humanos, pois podemos inferir, associar e raciocinar com informações contextuais de outras fontes para estabelecer uma imagem mais completa. Por exemplo, na Figura 1, podemos encontrar uma maneira de identificar as notícias relacionadas à imagem por meio de entendimentos segmentados dos sinais, dos prédios, das multidões e muito mais. Esse raciocínio pode fornecer a hora e o local em que a imagem foi tirada, o que nos ajudará em tarefas subsequentes, como construção automática de enredo, correção de fonte de imagem em fotografias de efeito pretendido e processamento de fluxo superior, como agrupamento de imagens para determinado local ou tempo .\n\nNeste trabalho, formulamos esse problema e apresentamos o TARA: um conjunto de dados com 16k imagens com suas notícias, horário e local associados, extraídos automaticamente do New York Times, e mais 61k exemplos como supervisão distante do WIT. Além das extrações, apresentamos um subconjunto crowdsourced no qual acreditamos ser possível encontrar as informações espaço-temporais das imagens para fins de avaliação. Mostramos que existe uma lacuna de $70\\%$ entre um modelo conjunto de última geração e o desempenho humano, que é um pouco preenchida pelo nosso modelo proposto que usa raciocínio segmentado, motivando modelos conjuntos de linguagem de visão de alto nível que pode conduzir o raciocínio aberto com o conhecimento do mundo.\nOs dados e o código estão disponíveis publicamente em https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA.', 'ja': '画像は、より完全な画像を確立するために、他のソースからのコンテキスト情報と推論、関連付け、および理性を得ることができるため、人間の目にとってピクセルだけよりも重要であることが多い。 例えば、図1では、標識、建物、群衆などの区分的な理解を通じて、画像に関連するニュース記事を識別する方法を見つけることができます。 この推論は、画像が撮影された時間と場所を提供する可能性があり、これは、ストーリーラインの自動構築、意図された効果写真の画像ソースの修正、特定の場所または時間の画像クラスタリングなどの上流処理などの後続のタスクに役立ちます。\n\nこの研究では、この問題を定式化し、TARAを紹介します。Taraは、ニューヨーク・タイムズから自動的に抽出された、関連するニュース、時間、場所を含む16,000の画像を含むデータセットであり、WITからの遠隔監視としてさらに61,000の例を紹介します。 抽出に加えて、評価目的で画像の空間時間情報を見つけることができると考えられるクラウドソーシングされたサブセットを提示します。 最先端のジョイントモデルと人間のパフォーマンスの間には$ 70 \\%$のギャップがあることを示しています。これは、セグメントごとの推論を使用し、世界の知識でオープンエンドの推論を行うことができる高レベルのビジョン-言語ジョイントモデルを動機づける提案されたモデルによってわずかに埋められています。\nデータとコードは、https://github.com/zeyofu/TARAで公開されています。', 'ru': 'Изображения часто более значимы, чем только пиксели для человеческих глаз, поскольку мы можем сделать вывод, связать и рассуждать с контекстной информацией из других источников, чтобы установить более полную картину. Например, на рисунке 1 мы можем найти способ идентифицировать новостные статьи, связанные с картиной, через сегментное понимание знаков, зданий, толп и многое другое. Это рассуждение может предоставить время и место, где было сделано изображение, что поможет нам в последующих задачах, таких как автоматическое построение сюжетной линии, коррекция источника изображения в предполагаемых эффектных фотографиях и обработка верхнего потока, такая как кластеризация изображений для определенного местоположения или времени.\n\nВ этой работе мы формулируем эту проблему и представляем ТАРУ: набор данных с 16 тысячами изображений с соответствующими новостями, временем и местоположением, автоматически извлеченными из New York Times, и дополнительные 61 тысячами примеров в качестве удаленного наблюдения от WIT. Помимо извлечений, мы представляем подмножество краудсорсинга, в котором, по нашему мнению, можно найти пространственно-временную информацию изображений для целей оценки. Мы показываем, что существует разрыв в $ 70\\%$ между самой современной моделью суставов и производительностью человека, который слегка заполняется нашей предлагаемой моделью, которая использует сегментное мышление, мотивируя модели более высокого уровня «зрение-язык», которые могут проводить открытое мышление с мировыми знаниями.\nДанные и код находятся в открытом доступе по адресу https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA.', 'zh': '图像常重于人眼之像素,盖可以推断,关联推理,自他上下文信息,以立完图片。 如图 1 之中,可以表建人细分解,得一法以识图片新闻文。 此理可以供拍摄日月地点,将有助于后事,如自故事情节构建,于期效照片中校正图象源,及上流处分,如特定位日月之象聚类。\n\n于此等事,发此问而引入TARA:一数集,其包16k像及相关之新闻,日月位置,自取于纽约时报,别有61k示例为WIT远程监督者。 提取之上,发一众包子集,信其中可觅空信以质之。 吾明先进之70\\%美元,吾道少补,当以细分理,激高层次愿景言,可以世开放式推理。\n数代码明于 https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA 。', 'hi': 'छवियां अक्सर मानव आंखों के लिए केवल पिक्सेल की तुलना में अधिक महत्वपूर्ण होती हैं, क्योंकि हम अधिक पूर्ण तस्वीर स्थापित करने के लिए अन्य स्रोतों से प्रासंगिक जानकारी के साथ अनुमान लगा सकते हैं, संबद्ध कर सकते हैं, और कारण कर सकते हैं। उदाहरण के लिए, चित्रा 1 में, हम संकेतों, इमारतों, भीड़ और अधिक की खंड-वार समझ के माध्यम से चित्र से संबंधित समाचार लेखों की पहचान करने का एक तरीका पा सकते हैं। यह तर्क छवि को समय और स्थान प्रदान कर सकता है, जो हमें बाद के कार्यों में मदद करेगा, जैसे कि स्वचालित कहानी निर्माण, इच्छित प्रभाव तस्वीरों में छवि स्रोत का सुधार, और कुछ स्थान या समय के लिए छवि क्लस्टरिंग जैसे ऊपरी-स्ट्रीम प्रसंस्करण।\n\nइस काम में, हम इस समस्या को तैयार करते हैं और TARA का परिचय देते हैं: उनके संबंधित समाचार, समय और स्थान के साथ 16k छवियों के साथ एक डेटासेट, स्वचालित रूप से न्यूयॉर्क टाइम्स से निकाला जाता है, और WIT से दूर के पर्यवेक्षण के रूप में एक अतिरिक्त 61k उदाहरण। निष्कर्षण के शीर्ष पर, हम एक क्राउडसोर्स्ड सबसेट पेश करते हैं जिसमें हम मानते हैं कि मूल्यांकन उद्देश्य के लिए छवियों की स्पैटिओ-टेम्पोरल जानकारी ढूंढना संभव है। हम दिखाते हैं कि एक अत्याधुनिक संयुक्त मॉडल और मानव प्रदर्शन के बीच $ 70 \\% $ का अंतर मौजूद है, जो हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल से थोड़ा भरा हुआ है जो सेगमेंट-वार तर्क का उपयोग करता है, उच्च-स्तरीय दृष्टि-भाषा संयुक्त मॉडल को प्रेरित करता है जो विश्व ज्ञान के साथ खुले अंत वाले तर्क का संचालन कर सकता है।\nडेटा और कोड सार्वजनिक रूप से https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ga': "Is minic go mbíonn íomhánna níos suntasaí ná na picteilíni amháin do shúile an duine, mar is féidir linn tátal a bhaint as, baint agus réasúnaíocht a dhéanamh le faisnéis chomhthéacsúil ó fhoinsí eile chun pictiúr níos iomláine a chruthú. Mar shampla, i bhFíor 1, is féidir linn teacht ar bhealach chun na hailt nuachta a bhaineann leis an bpictiúr a aithint trí thuiscintí ciallmhar ar na comharthaí, na foirgnimh, na sluaite agus go leor eile. D'fhéadfadh an réasúnaíocht seo an t-am agus an t-áit ar tógadh an íomhá a sholáthar, rud a chuideoidh linn i dtascanna ina dhiaidh sin, mar thógáil uathoibríoch scéal-líne, ceartú foinse íomhá i ngrianghraif éifeacht bheartaithe, agus próiseáil an tsrutha uachtair mar bhraisliú íomhá le haghaidh suíomh nó am áirithe. .\n\nSan obair seo, foirmímid an fhadhb seo agus tugtar isteach TARA: tacar sonraí le híomhánna 16k lena nuacht, am, agus suíomh a bhaineann leo, a bhaintear go huathoibríoch ó New York Times, agus 61k samplaí breise mar mhaoirseacht i bhfad i gcéin ó WIT. Anuas ar na hastarraingtí, cuirimid i láthair fothacar sluafhoinsithe ina gcreidimid gur féidir faisnéis spásúil-ama na n-íomhánna a aimsiú chun críche meastóireachta. Léirímid go bhfuil bearna $70\\%$ idir comhshamhail úrscothach agus feidhmíocht dhaonna, rud atá líonta de bheagán ag ár múnla molta a úsáideann réasúnaíocht deighleogach, rud a spreagann comhsamhlacha fís-teanga ag ardleibhéal. ar féidir leo réasúnaíocht neamhiata a dhéanamh le heolas an domhain.\nTá na sonraí agus an cód ar fáil go poiblí ag https://github.com/zeyofu/TARA.", 'ka': 'სურათები ძალიან უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ვიდრე მხოლოდ ადამიანის სახელებისთვის, როგორც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია შევცვალოთ, დაკავშიროთ და მიზეზი კონტექსტური ინფორმაცი მაგალითად, Figure 1-ში, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია აღმოვაჩინოთ გახსნა ინფორმაციის არტიკების განსაზღვრება, რომლებიც სექმენტის გაგრძნობით სექმენტის გაგრძნობით სიმბოლოების, სახლე ეს პარამენტი შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ დროს და გადატანა გამოსახულება, რომელიც ჩვენ შემდეგი დავამხმარებთ, როგორც ავტომატური ისტორილის შექმნა, გამოსახულების გამოსახულება გამოსახულების გამოსახულება გამოსახულებული ეფექტის ფ', 'el': 'Οι εικόνες είναι συχνά πιο σημαντικές από τα εικονοστοιχεία για τα ανθρώπινα μάτια, καθώς μπορούμε να συμπεράνουμε, να συσχετίσουμε και να συλλογιστούμε με πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος από άλλες πηγές για να δημιουργήσουμε μια πληρέστερη εικόνα. Για παράδειγμα, στο Σχήμα 1, μπορούμε να βρούμε έναν τρόπο να εντοπίσουμε τα άρθρα ειδήσεων που σχετίζονται με την εικόνα μέσω της κατανόησης τμημάτων των πινακίδων, των κτιρίων, του πλήθους και άλλων. Αυτός ο συλλογισμός θα μπορούσε να παράσχει τον χρόνο και τον τόπο λήψης της εικόνας, γεγονός που θα μας βοηθήσει σε επόμενες εργασίες, όπως η αυτόματη κατασκευή ιστοριών, η διόρθωση της πηγής εικόνας στις προβλεπόμενες φωτογραφίες εφέ και η επεξεργασία ανώτερης ροής, όπως η ομαδοποίηση εικόνων για συγκεκριμένη τοποθεσία ή χρόνο.', 'hu': 'A képek gyakran jelentősebbek, mint csak a pixelek az emberi szem számára, mivel más forrásokból származó kontextuális információkkal következtethetünk, összekapcsolhatjuk és észrevehetjük, hogy teljesebb képet hozzunk létre. Az 1. ábrán például megtalálhatjuk a képhez kapcsolódó hírek azonosításának módját a táblák, az épületek, a tömeg stb. szegmensszerű megértésével. Ez az érvelés biztosíthatja a kép készítésének időpontját és helyét, ami segít bennünket a későbbi feladatokban, mint például az automatikus történetépítés, a képforrás javítása a tervezett hatású fényképekben, valamint a felső-stream feldolgozás, mint például a képfürtözés bizonyos helyre vagy időre.', 'lt': 'Įvaizdai dažnai yra reikšmingesni nei tik žmogaus akyse esantys pikseliai, kaip galime daryti išvadą, sujungti ir pagrįsti kontekstinę informaciją iš kitų šaltinių, kad būtų sukurtas išsamesnis vaizdas. Pavyzdžiui, 1 paveiksle galime rasti būdą identifikuoti naujienų straipsnius, susijusius su paveikslu, per segmentinius ženklų, pastatų, minių ir daugiau supratimus. Šiuo pagrindimu būtų galima nustatyti laiką ir vietą, kurioje buvo paimtas vaizdas, o tai padėtų mums atlikti vėlesnes užduotis, pvz., automatinę istorijos linijos konstrukciją, vaizdo šaltinio pataisymą numatomose efekto nuotraukose ir viršutinio srauto apdorojimą, pvz., vaizdo klasifikavimą tam tikroje vietoje ar laike.', 'it': "Le immagini sono spesso più significative dei soli pixel per gli occhi umani, come possiamo dedurre, associare e ragionare con informazioni contestuali provenienti da altre fonti per stabilire un quadro più completo. Ad esempio, nella Figura 1, possiamo trovare un modo per identificare gli articoli di notizie relativi al quadro attraverso la comprensione segmentale dei segni, degli edifici, della folla e altro ancora. Questo ragionamento potrebbe fornire il tempo e il luogo in cui l'immagine è stata scattata, che ci aiuterà in compiti successivi, come la costruzione automatica della trama, la correzione della sorgente dell'immagine nelle fotografie con effetto previsto e l'elaborazione del flusso superiore come il raggruppamento di immagini per una certa posizione o tempo.", 'mk': 'Сликите честопати се поважни од само пикселите во човечките очи, како што можеме да заклучиме, да се поврземе и да се размислуваме со контекстуалните информации од други извори за да постигнеме поцелосна слика. На пример, на слика 1, можеме да најдеме начин да ги идентификуваме вестите поврзани со сликата преку сегментално разбирање на знаците, зградите, толпата и повеќе. Оваа причина би можела да го обезбеди времето и местото на снимањето на сликата, што ќе ни помогне во последните задачи, како што е автоматска изградба на приказни, корекција на изворот на слика во фотографии со наменети ефекти и преработка на врвниот поток како што е групирање на слики за одредена локација или време', 'ml': 'ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ കണ്ണുകള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രം പിക്സലുകള്\u200d മാത്രം പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റു സ്രോതസ്സുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല ഉദാഹരണത്തിനുള്ള ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി ഫിഗ്രാം 1-ല്\u200d, നമുക്ക് ചിത്രത്തോടൊപ്പം ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ഒരു വഴി കണ്ടെത്താം, അടയാ ഈ കാരണം ചിത്രം എടുത്തിരിക്കുന്ന സമയത്തെയും സ്ഥാനത്തെയും നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നതിനായിരിക്കും. അത് പിന്നീട് ജോലികളില്\u200d നമ്മെ സഹായിക്കും. അത് സ്വയം സ്റ്റോറിലിന്\u200d നി', 'ms': 'Imej sering lebih penting daripada hanya piksel pada mata manusia, seperti yang kita boleh menyimpulkan, sekutukan, dan alasan dengan maklumat kontekstual dari sumber lain untuk menetapkan gambar yang lebih lengkap. Contohnya, dalam Gambar 1, kita boleh mencari cara untuk mengenalpasti artikel berita yang berkaitan dengan gambar melalui pemahaman segmen tanda-tanda, bangunan, ramai, dan lebih. Alasan ini boleh menyediakan masa dan tempat imej telah diambil, yang akan membantu kita dalam tugas berikutnya, seperti pembangunan garis cerita automatik, perbaikan sumber imej dalam foto kesan yang ditentukan, dan pemprosesan strim-atas seperti kumpulan imej untuk lokasi atau masa tertentu.', 'mn': 'Зурагууд нь зөвхөн хүн төрөлхтний нүдний пикселээс илүү чухал байдаг. Бид өөр эх үүсвэрээс илүү төгс зургийг бүтээх, холбогдож чадна. Жишээлбэл, 1-р зурагт бид зургаас холбогдсон мэдээллийн баримтуудыг тодорхойлох арга олж чадна. Энэ шалтгаан нь зураг авагдсан цаг хугацаа, газрын байр болгож чадна. Энэ нь бидэнд дараагийн ажилд автоматически түүх барилгын тусламжтай болно.', 'no': 'Biletet er ofte meir signifikant enn berre pikslane til menneske øyne, slik at vi kan inferer, assosiera og grunnen med kontekstinformasjon frå andre kilder for å laga eit meir fullført bilete. For eksempel, i figur 1 kan vi finne ein måte å identifisera nye artikkelane som er relaterte til biletet gjennom segmentvis forståking av teikna, bygninga, folka og meir. Dette årsaken kan gjere tida og plasseringa av biletet som er tatt. Dette vil hjelpa oss i etternamne oppgåver, som automatisk lagringskonstilling, korrigering av biletkjelde i gjeldande effektfotografiar, og oppstrømmehandsaming som biletklassering for nokre plassering eller tid.', 'pl': 'Obrazy są często ważniejsze niż tylko pikseli dla ludzkich oczu, ponieważ możemy wnioskować, kojarzyć i rozumować z informacjami kontekstowymi z innych źródeł, aby stworzyć bardziej kompletny obraz. Na przykład, na rysunku 1, możemy znaleźć sposób na identyfikację artykułów wiadomościowych związanych z obrazem poprzez segmentowe zrozumienie znaków, budynków, tłumów i innych. Rozumowanie to może dostarczyć czasu i miejsca wykonania zdjęcia, co pomoże nam w kolejnych zadaniach, takich jak automatyczna konstrukcja fabuły, korekta źródła obrazu w zamierzonych zdjęciach efektowych i przetwarzanie górnego strumienia, takie jak klastrowanie obrazów dla określonej lokalizacji lub czasu.', 'kk': 'Кескіндердің көбінде ғана адамдардың көздеріне пикселдердің көздеріне көбірек болады. Бұл көздердің көздеріне көбірек, бұл көздердің мәліметін басқалардың мәліметтер Мысалы, 1- ригументінде, суреттің жаңалық мақалаларын білу арқылы белгілер, ғимараттар, көпшілік және көпшіліктерді түсініктері арқылы, жаңалық мақалаларды анықтай аламыз. Бұл себептеу кескіндің уақыты мен орналасуын келтіре алады. Бұл келесі тапсырмаларда, мысалы, автоматты жүктеу жолын құру, кескіндің көзін түзету үшін көзгертілген эффект фотографияларында және кескіндің кластерін бір жерд', 'ro': 'Imaginile sunt adesea mai semnificative decât pixelii pentru ochii umani, după cum putem deduce, asocia și raționa cu informații contextuale din alte surse pentru a stabili o imagine mai completă. De exemplu, în Figura 1, putem găsi o modalitate de a identifica articolele de știri legate de imagine prin înțelegerea segmentelor semnelor, clădirilor, mulțimilor și multe altele. Acest raționament ar putea oferi timpul și locul în care imaginea a fost realizată, ceea ce ne va ajuta în sarcini ulterioare, cum ar fi construirea automată a poveștii, corectarea sursei de imagine în fotografiile cu efect intenționat și procesarea fluxului superior, cum ar fi clusterizarea imaginilor pentru anumite locații sau timp.', 'sr': 'Slike su često važnije od samo piksela do ljudskih oèiju, kao što možemo inficirati, povezati i razumjeti s kontekstualnim informacijama iz drugih izvora da bi stvorili kompletniju sliku. Na primer, u figuri 1, možemo naći način da identifikujemo novinske članke povezane sa slikom kroz razumijevanje znakova, zgrada, publike i više. Ovaj razum bi mogao da obezbedi vrijeme i mesto gde je slika snimljena, što će nam pomoći u poslednjim zadacima, poput automatske konstrukcije priče, korištenja izvora slika u namjerenim fotografijama efekta, i procesiranja gornjeg struja kao što je skupljanje slika na određeno mjesto ili vrijeme.', 'so': 'Sawirada waxaa inta badan ka muhiimsan karta indhaha dadka oo kaliya, sababtoo ah waxaynu ka fekeri karnaa, la wadaagi karnaa, iyo sababo ku saabsan macluumaadka joogtada ah ee laga keenay sourceoyin kale si aan u dhisno sawir kamid ah. Tusaale ahaan lambarka 1 waxaan ka heli karaa waddo aan aqoonsanno warqadaha sawirka la xiriira si caqli ah u garanayno calaamada, dhismaha, dadka badnaanta. Sababkaas waxaa suurtogal ah in la siiyo waqti iyo waqti la qaaday sawirka, taas oo inagu caawinaya shaqooyin ka dambeeya, tusaale ahaan dhismaha sawirka automatic, hagaajiya sourceed sawirka oo lagu talo galay sawirada sawirka iyo sawirada sare, tusaale ahaan sawirka lagu soo bandhigayo meel ama waqti gaar ah.', 'si': 'පින්තූර පික්සෙල් මිනිස්සු ඇස් වලට පික්සෙල් වඩා විශේෂයි, අපිට පුළුවන්, සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න හේතු උදාහරණයෙන්, පින්තූර 1 වල, අපිට පුළුවන් විදිහට පින්තූරය සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පින්තූරයක් හොයාගන්න පුළ මේ හිතන්නේ පින්තූර ගත්ත වෙලාව සහ ස්ථානය සඳහා පින්තූරය අපිට උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාලින් නිර්මාණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාලින් ස', 'sv': 'Bilder är ofta mer betydelsefulla än bara pixlarna för mänskliga ögon, eftersom vi kan härleda, associera och resonera med kontextuell information från andra källor för att skapa en mer fullständig bild. I figur 1 kan vi till exempel hitta ett sätt att identifiera nyhetsartiklar relaterade till bilden genom segmentvis förståelse av skyltar, byggnader, folkmassor med mera. Detta resonemang kan ge tid och plats bilden togs, vilket kommer att hjälpa oss i efterföljande uppgifter, såsom automatisk storyline konstruktion, korrigering av bildkälla i avsedda effektfotografier, och övre strömsbehandling såsom bildklustring för viss plats eller tid.', 'ta': 'பிம்பங்கள் பெரும்பாலாகவே மனித கண்களுக்கு மட்டும் புகிய படங்கள் மட்டும் முக்கியமானது, ஏனெனில் நாம் மற்ற மூலங்களிலிருந்து ஒரு முழு பட எடுத்துகாட்டாக, குறிப்புகள், கட்டிடங்கள், மக்கள் மற்றும் அதிகமாக புரிந்து கொள்ள செய்தி பொருட்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு வழியை கண்டுபிடிக்க ம இந்த காரணத்தால் பிம்பத்தை எடுத்த நேரத்தையும் இடத்தையும் வழங்கலாம், பின்வரும் பணிகளில் அது எங்களுக்கு உதவும், பிம்பத்தின் மூலம் தானாகவே செயல்படுத்தல், பிம்பத்தின் விள', 'ur': 'تصاویر اکثر صرف انسان کی آنکھوں سے زیادہ اہم ہیں، جیسا کہ ہم ایک مکمل تصویر بنانے کے لئے دوسرے منبع سے متوسط معلومات کے ساتھ آزاد کرسکتے ہیں، اور اس سے زیادہ اثر کرسکتے ہیں. مثال، تصویر ۱ میں، ہم ایک طریقہ پیدا کر سکتے ہیں کہ تصویر کے معاملہ کی خبریں معلوم کریں، نشانیوں، عمارتوں، جماعتوں اور زیادہ سمجھنے کے ذریعہ۔ یہ دلیل بتائی ہے کہ تصویر کو لیا گیا تھا اور اس کے بعد ہماری مدد کرے گا، جیسے اتماٹی صفحہ بنانا، تصویر سورج کی اصلاح کرنا، تصویر کے ذریعہ تصویر کے ساتھ، اور بالا تری پرسس کرنا، جیسے تصویر کلاسترینگ کے لئے ایک مقررہ جگہ یا وقت کے لئے۔', 'mt': 'L-immaġni ta’ spiss huma aktar sinifikanti mill-pixels biss fl-għajnejn tal-bniedem, kif nistgħu niinferu, nassoċjaw, u nirriġunaw ma’ informazzjoni kuntestwali minn sorsi oħra biex nistabbilixxu stampa aktar kompleta. Pereżempju, fil-Figura 1, nistgħu nsibu mod kif nidentifikaw l-artikoli tal-a ħbarijiet relatati mal-istampa permezz ta’ fehim segmentali tas-sinjali, il-bini, il-massa, u aktar. Dan ir-raġunament jista’ jipprovdi ż-żmien u l-post li l-immaġni ttieħdet, li se jgħinuna f’kompiti sussegwenti, bħall-kostruzzjoni awtomatika tal-linji tal-istorja, il-korrezzjoni tas-sors tal-immaġni f’ritratti b’effett maħsub, u l-ipproċessar ta’ fuq il-fluss bħall-raggruppament tal-immaġni għal ċertu post', 'uz': "Rasmlar odatda oddiy nuqta ko'zlaridan ham juda muhim, chunki biz ko'rinishimiz mumkin va boshqa manbalar bilan bir kam rasmni ishlab chiqarishimiz mumkin. Masalan, Figur 1-da, biz rasm bilan ma'lumot maqolalarini aniqlashga yordam topamiz, belgilar, guruhlar, jamiyatlarni ko'proq ko'proq ko'rinishimiz mumkin. This reasoning could provide the time and place the image was taken, which will help us in subsequent tasks, such as automatic storyline construction, correction of image source in intended effect photographs, and upper-stream processing such as image clustering for certain location or time.", 'vi': 'Những hình ảnh thường quan trọng hơn chỉ điểm ảnh với mắt người, như chúng ta có thể kết luận, liên kết, và lý do với các thông tin ngữ cảnh từ các nguồn khác để tạo ra một hình ảnh hoàn hảo hơn. Ví dụ, trong hình số 1, chúng ta có thể tìm ra cách để xác định các bài báo liên quan tới bức tranh thông qua các nhận thức về các dấu hiệu, các tòa nhà, đám đông, và nhiều hơn nữa. Lý do này có thể cung cấp thời gian và địa điểm ảnh được chụp, nó sẽ giúp chúng ta trong các nhiệm vụ tiếp theo, như việc xây dựng mạch truyện tự động, sửa chữa nguồn ảnh trong các bức ảnh kết quả được cung cấp, và xử lý dòng thượng như tụ tập ảnh cho một số địa điểm hay thời gian nhất định.', 'bg': 'Изображенията често са по-значими от пикселите към човешките очи, тъй като можем да заключим, асоциираме и разсъждаваме с контекстуална информация от други източници, за да създадем по-пълна картина. Например, на фигура 1 можем да намерим начин да идентифицираме новинарските статии, свързани с картината, чрез сегментно разбиране на знаците, сградите, тълпите и др. Тази логика би могла да осигури времето и мястото, където е направено изображението, което ще ни помогне при последващи задачи, като автоматично изграждане на сюжета, корекция на източника на изображението в снимки с предназначени ефекти и обработка на горния поток, като например клъстериране на изображения за определено място или време.', 'nl': "Beelden zijn vaak belangrijker dan alleen de pixels voor menselijke ogen, omdat we contextuele informatie uit andere bronnen kunnen afleiden, associëren en redeneren om een completer beeld te creëren. In Figuur 1 kunnen we bijvoorbeeld een manier vinden om de nieuwsberichten met betrekking tot de foto te identificeren door segmentgewijs begrip van de borden, de gebouwen, de drukte en meer. Deze redenering kan de tijd en plaats van de opname geven, wat ons zal helpen bij volgende taken, zoals automatische verhaallijnconstructie, correctie van de beeldbron in beoogde effectfoto's, en upper-stream verwerking zoals beeldclustering voor bepaalde locatie of tijd.", 'da': 'Billeder er ofte mere betydningsfulde end kun pixels til menneskelige øjne, som vi kan udlede, associere og fornufte med kontekstuelle oplysninger fra andre kilder for at etablere et mere komplet billede. I figur 1 kan vi f.eks. finde en måde at identificere nyhedsartiklerne relateret til billedet gennem segmentmæssig forståelse af skiltene, bygningerne, folkemængderne og meget mere. Denne ræsonnement kunne give tid og sted billedet blev taget, hvilket vil hjælpe os i efterfølgende opgaver, såsom automatisk historiekonstruktion, korrektion af billedkilde i tilsigtede effektfotografier og øvre-stream behandling såsom billedklyngning for bestemt sted eller tid.', 'hr': 'Slike su često važnije od samo piksela do ljudskih očiju, kao što možemo inferirati, pridružiti i razumjeti s kontekstskim informacijama iz drugih izvora kako bi stvorili kompletniju sliku. Na primjer, u figuri 1, možemo naći način za identifikaciju novinskih članaka vezanih za sliku kroz razumijevanje znakova, zgrada, publike i više. Ovaj razum bi mogao osigurati vrijeme i mjesto koje je snimljeno slike, što će nam pomoći u sljedećim zadacima, poput automatske konstrukcije skladišta, korištenja izvora slika u smišljenim fotografijama učinka, i obradivanje gornjeg toka poput skupljanja slika na određeno mjesto ili vrijeme.', 'de': 'Bilder sind oft bedeutsamer als nur die Pixel für menschliche Augen, da wir Kontextinformationen aus anderen Quellen ableiten, verknüpfen und begründen können, um ein vollständigeres Bild zu erhalten. Beispielsweise können wir in Abbildung 1 eine Möglichkeit finden, die mit dem Bild verbundenen Nachrichtenartikel durch segmentweise Verständnis der Zeichen, der Gebäude, der Menschenmengen und mehr zu identifizieren. Diese Argumentation könnte die Zeit und den Ort angeben, an dem das Bild aufgenommen wurde, was uns bei nachfolgenden Aufgaben helfen wird, wie der automatischen Storyline-Konstruktion, der Korrektur der Bildquelle in beabsichtigten Effektfotos und der Upstream-Verarbeitung wie dem Bildclustern für bestimmte Orte oder Zeiten.', 'id': 'Gambar sering lebih signifikan daripada hanya piksel pada mata manusia, seperti yang kita bisa mengaduga, mengadakan asosiasi, dan alasan dengan informasi kontekstual dari sumber lain untuk menetapkan gambar yang lebih lengkap. Contohnya, dalam Figure 1, kita dapat menemukan cara untuk mengidentifikasi artikel berita yang berhubungan dengan gambar melalui pemahaman segment-wise tanda-tanda, bangunan, kerumunan, dan lebih. This reasoning could provide the time and place the image was taken, which will help us in subsequent tasks, such as automatic storyline construction, correction of image source in intended effect photographs, and upper-stream processing such as image clustering for certain location or time.', 'ko': '사람의 눈에 있어서 이미지는 보통 픽셀보다 더 중요하다. 왜냐하면 우리는 다른 출처에서 온 상하문 정보를 추측하고 관련하며 추리하여 더욱 완전한 이미지를 구축할 수 있기 때문이다.예를 들어 그림1에서 우리는 표지, 건축, 사람들 등에 대한 단락 이해를 통해 그림과 관련된 뉴스 문장을 식별하는 방법을 찾을 수 있다.이런 추리는 이미지를 촬영하는 시간과 장소를 제공할 수 있다. 이것은 우리가 후속 임무를 완성하는 데 도움이 될 것이다. 예를 들어 자동으로 이야기 줄거리를 구축하고 예상한 효과 사진의 이미지 원본을 바로잡으며 특정한 위치나 시간의 이미지 분류와 같은 상위 처리를 할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Picha mara nyingi zina umuhimu zaidi ya pixeli tu kwa macho ya binadamu, kwa sababu tunaweza kupunguza, ushirikiano, na sababu za taarifa za kimataifa kutoka vyanzo vingine ili kutengeneza picha kamili zaidi. Kwa mfano, katika Takwimu ya 1, tunaweza kutambua njia ya kutambua makala za habari zinazohusiana na picha hiyo kupitia uelewa wa ishara, majengo, umati, na zaidi. Sababu hii inaweza kutoa muda na kuweka picha ilivyochukuliwa, ambazo zitatusaidia katika kazi za baadae, kama vile ujenzi wa hadithi za kujitegemea, uharibifu wa chanzo cha picha kwa lengo la kutengeneza picha, na upasuaji wa miti ya juu kama vile picha yenye maeneo au wakati fulani.', 'fa': 'تصاویر اغلب بیشتر از پیکسل\u200cها به چشم\u200cهای انسان هستند، همانطور که می\u200cتوانیم با اطلاعات متوسطی از منابع دیگر آزمایش کنیم، و دلیل\u200cهایی با اطلاعات متوسطی از منابع دیگر برای ایجاد یک تصویر کامل\u200cتر باشیم برای مثال، در تصویر ۱، می\u200cتوانیم راهی پیدا کنیم که مقاله\u200cهای اخبار ارتباط با تصویر را از طریق فهمیدن نشانه\u200cها، ساختمان\u200cها، جمعیت\u200cها و بیشتر از آن پیدا کنیم. این دلیل می\u200cتواند زمان و جایی را که تصویر گرفته شده است، به ما کمک کند، که در کار بعدی، مانند ساختن خط داستان اتوماتیک، اصلاح منبع تصویر در عکس\u200cهای تاثیر مقرر شده، و پرداخت رودخانه بالا مانند کلاستر تصویر برای مکان یا زمان خاص.', 'tr': 'Resimler diňe piksellerden kişiň gözlere degişli ýagdaýda has möhüm bolýar. Biziň daşyryp, daşyryp bilýän ýagdaýymyz bilen nähili möhüm surat çykmak üçin başga çeşmelerden habarlar bilen düşündirilýäris. mysal 1-de, figura 1-de haberler makalasyny suratyň, binalaryň, topluklaryň we ýene-de düşünýän şeklini tapyp bileris. Bu sebäp suraty çekilýän wagtyny we ýerini saýlap bilerdi. Bu sebäbi bize soňra gören işlerde, mesela storylan gurluşy ýaly awtomatik taýýarlama, surat çeşmesiniň düzeltmesi nähili täsirli suratlar we üst akyl işlemesi ýaly surat klusterlemesi ýaly belli ýere ýa-da wagt üçin.', 'af': "Beelde is dikwels meer belangrik as net die pixels tot menslike oë, soos ons kan infer, assosieer en rede met kontekslike inligting van ander bronne om 'n meer volledige prent te stel. Byvoorbeeld, in Figur 1, kan ons 'n manier vind om die nuus artikels te identifiseer wat met die prent verwante is deur segmentwyse verstaan van die tekens, die boue, die skare en meer. Hierdie redening kan die tyd en plek van die beeld aangeneem word, wat sal ons help in volgende opdragte, soos outomatiese storylyn konstruksie, korreksie van beeldbron in bedoelde effekte fotografies, en bo-stroom verwerking soos beeldklestering vir sekere ligging of tyd.", 'am': 'መልዕክቶች ብዙ ጊዜ ከpixels ወደ ሰዎች ዓይኖች ብቻ የበለጡ ናቸው፤ እና ከሌሎች ምንጮች የውይይት መረጃዎችን እና ምሳሌን ለመሥራት እናስችላለን፡፡ ለምሳሌ በFigure 1፣ የምስራቱን ጽሑፎች በተለየ ማስታወቂያውን፣ ቤቶችን፣ የሕዝቡን አካባቢ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህ ምክንያት ምስሉን የተወሰደውን ሰዓት እና ስፍራውን ማቅረብ ይችላል፤ ይህም ምስሉን ማቀናጃ፣ የፎቶግራፎችን ማቀናጃ እና የላይ ውይይት ማቀናጃ እንደምሳሌ ምስል ማቅረብ ወይም ጊዜን በመስጠት ይረዳናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Պատկերները հաճախ ավելի կարևոր են, քան միայն մարդկային աչքերի կետերը, ինչպես մենք կարող ենք եզրակացնել, ասոցացվել և մտածել այլ աղբյուրների կոնտեքստային ինֆորմացիայի հետ ավելի ամբողջական պատկեր ստեղծելու համար: Օրինակ, 1-րդ նկարում մենք կարող ենք ճանապարհ հայտնաբերել պատկերի հետ կապված նորությունների հոդվածները, օգտագործելով նշանների, շենքերի, ամբոխի և այլն բաժանված հասկանալիքների միջոցով: Այս մտածելակերպը կարող է տրամադրել պատկերի վերացման ժամանակը և տեղը, ինչը կօգնի մեզ հետագա առաջադրանքներում, ինչպիսիք են պատմությունների ավտոմատիկ կառուցվածքը, պատկերի աղբյուրի ուղղությունը մտադրված էֆեկտի լուսանկարներում, և վերևի հոսանքի վերամշակումը, ինչպիս', 'bn': 'ছবিগুলো প্রায়শই মানুষের চোখে পিক্সেলের চেয়ে বেশী গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যেহেতু আমরা অন্যান্য সূত্রের কাছ থেকে সংক্রান্ত তথ্য প্রত উদাহরণস্বরূপ, ফিগার্গ ১-এ, আমরা ছবির সাথে সংবাদ প্রবন্ধগুলোকে চিহ্নিত করার উপায় খুঁজে বের করতে পারি প্রবন্ধের মাধ্যমে সংবাদ প্রকাশ করা য এই কারণে ছবিটি নির্মাণ করা সময় এবং সেখানে যেতে পারে, যেটি পরবর্তী কাজে আমাদের সাহায্য করবে, যেমন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্টোরিলাইন নির্মাণ, ছবির উৎসের সংশোধনের উদ্দেশ্যে ছবির', 'bs': 'Slike su često važnije od samo piksela do ljudskih očiju, kao što možemo inferirati, povezati i razumjeti s kontekstskim informacijama iz drugih izvora da bi stvorili kompletniju sliku. Na primjer, u figuri 1, možemo naći način da identifikujemo novinske članke povezane sa slikom kroz razumijevanje znakova, zgrada, publike i više. Ovaj razgovor bi mogao pružiti vrijeme i mjesto na kojem je slika snimljena, što će nam pomoći u posljednjim zadacima, poput automatske konstrukcije priče, korištenja izvora slika u namjerenim fotografijama učinka, i procesiranja gornjeg struja kao što je skupljanje slika na određeno mjesto ili vrijeme.', 'cs': 'Obrázky jsou často významnější než pouze pixely pro lidské oči, protože můžeme vyvodit, spojovat a uvážit kontextové informace z jiných zdrojů, abychom vytvořili kompletnější obraz. Například v obrázku 1, můžeme najít způsob, jak identifikovat zpravodajské články související s obrázkem prostřednictvím segmentového porozumění značek, budov, davů a dalších. Toto uvažování by mohlo poskytnout čas a místo pořízení snímku, což nám pomůže při následných úkolech, jako je automatická konstrukce příběhu, korekce zdroje obrazu v zamýšlených efektových fotografiích a zpracování horního proudu, jako je shlukování obrazů pro určité místo nebo čas.', 'sq': 'Imagjet janë shpesh më të rëndësishme se vetëm pikselët në sytë e njeriut, siç mund të përfundojmë, të bashkojmë dhe të arsyetojmë me informacionin kontekstual nga burime të tjera për të krijuar një fotografi më të plotë. Për shembull, në Figurën 1, mund të gjejmë një mënyrë për të identifikuar artikujt e lajmeve lidhur me fotografinë nëpërmjet kuptimeve segmentore të shenjave, ndërtesave, turmave, dhe më shumë. Ky arsyetim mund të sigurojë kohën dhe vendin ku është marrë imazhi, i cili do të na ndihmojë në detyrat e mëvonshme, të tilla si ndërtimi automatik i rrjetave historike, korrigjimi i burimit të imazhit në fotografitë me efekt të caktuar dhe procesimi i rrjetit të lartë të tillë si grupimi i imazheve për një vend apo kohë të caktuar.', 'et': 'Pildid on sageli tähtsamad kui ainult pikslid inimsilmadele, sest saame järeldada, seostada ja mõelda teistest allikatest pärit kontekstiteabega, et luua täielikum pilt. Näiteks joonisel 1 leiame võimaluse pildiga seotud uudisteartiklite tuvastamiseks segmendipõhise arusaamise kaudu märkidest, hoonetest, rahvahulgast jne. See põhjendus võib anda aja ja koha, kus pilt tehti, mis aitab meil hilisemates ülesannetes, nagu näiteks automaatne stsenaariumi konstrueerimine, pildiallika parandamine kavandatud efektifotodel ja ülemise voolu töötlemine, näiteks pildiklasserimine teatud asukoha või aja jaoks.', 'az': 'Görüntülər yalnız insan gözlərinə piksellərdən daha çox möhümlüdür, biz daha tamam bir şəkil yaratmaq üçün digər mənbələrdən müxtəlif məlumatlarla birləşdirə bilərik. Məsələn, 1. Şekil içində, şəkillərlə bağlı xəbər məsələlərini dəyişdirmək üçün bir yol tapırıq. Bu dəyişiklik şəkillərin alındığı vaxt və yerini təmin edə bilər. Bu şəkillərin sonrakı işlərdə bizə yardım edəcək, məsələn şəkillərin mənbəsini düzəltməsi və şəkillərin müəyyən bir yerə və vaxtda müəyyən edilməsi kimi şəkillərin clusterinə kömək edəcək.', 'fi': 'Kuvat ovat usein tärkeämpiä kuin vain pikselit ihmisen silmiin, koska voimme päätellä, yhdistää ja järkeillä kontekstitietoja muista lähteistä saadaksemme kattavamman kuvan. Kuviosta 1 löydämme esimerkiksi tavan tunnistaa kuvaan liittyvät uutisartikkelit segmenttiviisaan ymmärrykseen kylteistä, rakennuksista, väkijoukoista jne. Tämä päättely voisi antaa kuvan ottamisen ajan ja paikan, mikä auttaa meitä seuraavissa tehtävissä, kuten automaattisessa tarinanrakennuksessa, kuvalähteen korjauksessa aiotuissa tehostevalokuvissa ja ylemmän virran prosessoinnissa, kuten kuvaklusteroinnissa tietylle sijainnille tai ajalle.', 'ca': "Les imatges són sovint més significatives que només els píxels dels ulls humans, com podem deduir, associar i raonar amb informació contextual d'altres fonts per establir una imatge més completa. For example, in Figure 1, we can find a way to identify the news articles related to the picture through segment-wise understandings of the signs, the buildings, the crowds, and more.  Aquest raonament podria proporcionar el temps i el lloc en què s'ha fet la imatge, que ens ajudarà en tasques posteriors, com la construcció automàtica de línies d'històries, la correcció de la font d'imatge en fotografies d'efecte previst, i el processament de flux superior, com la agrupació d'imatges per cert lloc o temps.", 'ha': "Images are often more significant than only the pixels to human eyes, as we can infer, associate, and reason with contextual information from other sources to establish a more complete picture.  Misali, a Figur 1, Munã iya sãmun hanyar mu iya gane makala na lãbãri masu husũma da surar, a matsayin sigogi, misalin gidan, da mutane, da yawa. Wannan sababinsa yana iya bãyar da lokaci da aka sami zanen, wanda zai taimake mu cikin aikin bayan, kamar mazaɗar bakwai farat ɗaya, da gyare-sourcen zane da za'a yi amfani da zane-zane masu amfani da shiryoyin fotografo, da samun zartarwa na samar-sura kamar zane ta ƙara wa wani wuri ko lokaci.", 'sk': 'Slike so pogosto pomembnejše od zgolj slikovnih pik v človeških očeh, saj lahko sklepamo, povežemo in razumemo z kontekstualnimi informacijami iz drugih virov, da bi ustvarili bolj popolno sliko. Na sliki 1 lahko na primer najdemo način, kako prepoznati novice, povezane s sliko, skozi segmentno razumevanje znakov, stavb, množic in še več. Ta obrazložitev bi lahko zagotovila čas in kraj, kjer je bila slika posneta, kar nam bo pomagalo pri nadaljnjih nalogah, kot so avtomatska konstrukcija zgodbe, popravek vira slike na predvidenih fotografijah učinka in obdelava zgornjega toka, kot je grudiranje slik za določeno lokacijo ali čas.', 'jv': 'gambar Ombudhakan, nèng image 1, kita iso nggoleki maneh kanggo ngilangno artik sing perkaran anyar tentang karo nggawe barang langgar-aké digorakno liyane perusahaan liyane perusahaan liyane, ngêngé, uwong, lan akeh lan tambah. Rasane iki iso nggawe Tiara lan sandi Where am I-Imagen iki baka bantuan kita ngejaraké ning acara dadi, koyo ngono nggawe dolanan tarjamahan (auto)', 'he': 'תמונות הן לעתים קרובות יותר משמעותיות רק הפיקסלים לעיניים האנושיות, כפי שאנחנו יכולים למצוא, לשותף, ולהגיון עם מידע קונטקסטי ממקורים אחרים כדי להקים תמונה מושלמת יותר. לדוגמה, בתמונה 1, אנחנו יכולים למצוא דרך לזהות את מאמרי החדשות הקשורים לתמונה דרך הבנות מבחינה סגמנטית של הסימנים, הבניינים, הקהל, ויותר. הסיבה הזו יכולה לספק את הזמן והמקום שבו התמונה נלקחה, אשר יעזור לנו במשימות שלאחר מכן, כמו בניית קווי סיפורים אוטומטיים, תיקון מקור התמונה בתמונות תופעות מתוכננות, ועבודה על זרם העליון, כמו התמונות של מיקום או זמן מסוים.', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་རྒྱ་ནག་མི་མིག་ཟུར་ལ་ལས་ཚོར་ཆེ་བའི་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡིན། དཔེར་ན། རི་མོ༡ནང་གི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་ཆེན་དག་གི་བརྡ་སྐོར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་འདྲེན་བྱས་ཏེ། This reasoning could provide the time and place the image was taken, which will help us in subsequent tasks, such as automatic storyline construction, correction of image source in intended effect photographs, and upper-stream processing such as image clustering for certain location or time.'}
{'en': 'A Neural Network Architecture for Program Understanding Inspired by Human Behaviors', 'ar': 'FORTAP: استخدام الصيغ للتدريب المسبق للجدول العددي المنطق المدرك', 'fr': 'FORTAP\xa0: Utilisation de formules pour le pré-apprentissage de tables prenant en compte le raisonnement numérique', 'pt': 'FORTAP: Usando Fórmulas para o Pré-treinamento de Tabelas de Raciocínio Numérico', 'es': 'FORTAP: Uso de fórmulas para el preentrenamiento de tablas con razonamiento numérico', 'ja': 'FORTAP ：数値推論-認識テーブルの事前トレーニングに数式を使用する', 'hi': 'FORTAP: संख्यात्मक-तर्क-जागरूक तालिका Pretraining के लिए सूत्रों का उपयोग करना', 'zh': 'FORTAP:用公式数推理知表预训练', 'ru': 'FORTAP: Использование формул для предварительной подготовки таблиц с численным обоснованием', 'ga': 'FORTAP: Ag baint úsáide as Foirmlí le haghaidh Réamhoiliúint Tábla Uimhriúil-Réasúnúcháin-Aware', 'ka': 'FORTAP: Numerical- Reasoning- Aware Table Pretraining', 'el': 'Φορτάπ: Χρήση τύπων για την προεπιλογή πίνακα αριθμητικής λογικής', 'hu': 'FORTAP: Képletek használata numerikus ésszerű táblázat előkészítéséhez', 'it': 'FORTAP: Utilizzo delle formule per la pretraining della tabella basata sulla ragione numerica', 'kk': 'FORTAP: Бірнеше себептерді түсініп тұратын кестенің пішімдерін қолдану', 'lt': 'FORTAP: Naudojant formules, skirtas skaitmeninio pagrįstumo ir supratimo lentelėms pratęsti', 'mk': 'ФОРТАП: Користење формули за преправање на масата со бројни разуми', 'ms': 'FORTAP: Mengguna Formula untuk Pelatihan Jadual-Memahami-Nombor', 'ml': 'ഫോര്\u200dട്ടാപ്: അക്കങ്ങള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഫോര്\u200dമുലാസുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു- അറിയുന്ന ടേബിള്\u200d പ്ര', 'mt': 'FORTAP: L-użu ta’ Formoli għat-Tħarriġ ta’ Tabella dwar ir-Raġunar Numeriku', 'no': 'FORTAP: Bruk Formular for nummere- årsakende tabell', 'ro': 'FORTAP: Utilizarea formulelor pentru prepregătirea tabelului de raționare numerică', 'pl': 'FORTAP: Używanie wzorów do wstępnego treningu tabeli świadomej rozumowania numerycznego', 'sr': 'Koristi formule za brojne razloge za pristupanje tablice', 'so': 'FORTAP: Isticmaalka Formulas for Numeral-Reading-Known Table Preparation', 'si': 'අංක- කාරණාකරණ- ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරය භාවිත කරන්න', 'sv': 'FORTAP: Använda formler för numerisk resonemang-Aware tabell Pretraining', 'ta': 'FORTAP: எண்ணிக்கை- படிக்கும் அறிவு அட்டவணை முன்பயிற்சிக்கு வடிவங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'فورٹاپ: شماری-دلیل-آگاہ ٹیبل پرٹرین کے لئے فرمول استعمال کیا جاتا ہے', 'mn': 'ФОРТАП: Тоон-шалтгаан холбогдолтой хүснэгтийн шалтгааныг ашиглах', 'uz': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'vi': 'VTAP: Sử dụng Mẫu đơn cho bảng hình thức', 'bg': 'Използване на формули за предварително обучение на таблици с цифрово обосноване', 'hr': 'FORTAP: Korištenje formula za brojne razumne tablice pretvaranje', 'nl': 'FORTAP: Formules gebruiken voor numerieke redenering-bewuste tabel pretraining', 'da': 'FORTAP: Brug af formler til numerisk begrundelse-bevidst tabel forudgående', 'de': 'FORTAP: Verwenden von Formeln für numerisch begründete Tabellenvorbereitung', 'id': 'FORTAP: Menggunakan Formula untuk Pelatihan Tabel Berdasarkan-Nomor', 'fa': 'FORTAP: استفاده از فرمول\u200cها برای تنظیم میز شماره\u200cی دلایل آگاهی', 'ko': 'FORTAP: 공식을 사용하여 수치 추리 감지표 예행 훈련', 'sw': 'FORTAP: Utumiaji wa Formula kwa ajili ya Mafunzo ya Mifumo ya Wasomaji na Sahihi', 'af': 'FORTAP: Gebruik formule vir numeries- redekening- Aware Tabel Pretraining', 'sq': 'FORTAP: Përdorimi i formulave për pretendimin e tabelës me arsye numërore', 'tr': 'FORTAP:Numerical-Reasoning-Aware Tablo Pretraining için Formulalar kullanılıyor', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'ՖորՏԱՊ. Օգտագործելով ֆորմուլներ թվային-մտածելի-գիտակցության աղյուսակի պատրաստման համար', 'bn': 'ফোর্টাপ: সংখ্যা প্রাপ্ত টেবিল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য ফর্মুলা ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'FORTAP: Numerical-Reasoning-Aware Table Pretraining', 'bs': 'Koristi formule za brojne razloge za pristupanje tablice', 'ca': 'FORTAP: Utilitzant fòrmules per a predir taules de raonament numèric', 'cs': 'FORTAP: Použití vzorců pro předškolení tabulky s numerickým odůvodněním', 'et': 'FORTAP: valemite kasutamine numbrilise mõistmise teadlikuks tabeli eeltreeninguks', 'fi': 'FORTAP: Kaavojen käyttäminen numeerisen päättelyn tietoiseen taulukon esikoulutukseen', 'sk': 'FORTAP: Uporaba formul za predvajanje tabel s številčnim razlogom', 'jv': 'For', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'FORTAP: השימוש בנורמלים עבור שימוש מודע לשולחן בהגיון מספרי', 'bo': 'FORTAP: Using Formulas for Numerical-Reasoning-Aware Table Pretraining'}
{'en': 'Program understanding is a fundamental task in program language processing Despite the success existing works fail to take human behaviors as reference in understanding programs In this paper we consider human behaviors and propose the PGNN EK model that consists of two main components On the one hand inspired by the divide and conquer reading behaviors of humans we present a partitioning based graph neural network model PGNN on the upgraded AST of codes On the other hand to characterize human behaviors of resorting to other resources to help code comprehension we transform raw codes with external knowledge and apply pre training techniques for information extraction Finally we combine the two embeddings generated from the two components to output code embeddings We conduct extensive experiments to show the superior performance of PGNN EK on the code summarization and code clone detection tasks In particular to show the generalization ability of our model we release a new dataset that is more challenging for code clone detection and could advance the development of the community Our codes and data are publicly available at https://github.com/RecklessRonan/PGNN-EK', 'ar': 'تخزن الجداول بيانات رقمية غنية ، لكن التفكير العددي على الجداول لا يزال يمثل تحديًا. في هذه الورقة ، وجدنا أن صيغة جدول البيانات ، وهي لغة شائعة الاستخدام لإجراء العمليات الحسابية على القيم الرقمية في جداول البيانات ، هي إشراف قيم على التفكير العددي في الجداول. بالنظر إلى الكميات الكبيرة من جداول البيانات المتاحة على الويب ، نقترح FORTAP ، وهي أول استكشاف للاستفادة من صيغ جداول البيانات للتدريب المسبق على الجدول. يتم اشتقاق هدفين جديدين للتدريب المسبق تحت الإشراف الذاتي من الصيغ والتنبؤ بالمرجع الرقمي (NRP) والتنبؤ بالحساب العددي (NCP). في حين أن أهدافنا المقترحة عامة للتشفير ، لالتقاط تخطيطات وهياكل جداول البيانات بشكل أفضل ، فإن FORTAP مبنية على TUTA ، وهي الطريقة الأولى القائمة على المحولات لجدول جدول البيانات قبل التدريب مع الاهتمام الشجري. يتفوق FORTAP على أحدث الأساليب من خلال هوامش كبيرة في ثلاث مجموعات بيانات تمثيلية للتنبؤ بالصيغة ، والإجابة على الأسئلة ، وتصنيف نوع الخلية ، مما يُظهر الإمكانات الكبيرة للاستفادة من الصيغ للتدريب المسبق على الجدول.', 'es': 'Las tablas almacenan datos numéricos ricos, pero el razonamiento numérico sobre las tablas sigue siendo un desafío. En este artículo, descubrimos que la fórmula de la hoja de cálculo, un lenguaje de uso común para realizar cálculos sobre valores numéricos en hojas de cálculo, es una valiosa supervisión del razonamiento numérico en tablas. Teniendo en cuenta las grandes cantidades de hojas de cálculo disponibles en la web, proponemos FORTAP, la primera exploración para aprovechar las fórmulas de las hojas de cálculo para el entrenamiento previo de mesas. Dos objetivos novedosos de preentrenamiento autosupervisado se derivan de las fórmulas, la predicción de referencia numérica (NRP) y la predicción de cálculo numérico (NCP). Si bien nuestros objetivos propuestos son genéricos para los codificadores, para capturar mejor los diseños y estructuras de las tablas de hojas de cálculo, FORTAP se basa en TUTA, el primer método basado en transformadores para el preentrenamiento de tablas de hojas de cálculo con atención al árbol. FORTAP supera a los métodos más avanzados por grandes márgenes en tres conjuntos de datos representativos de predicción de fórmulas, respuesta a preguntas y clasificación de tipos de celdas, lo que demuestra el gran potencial de aprovechar las fórmulas para el entrenamiento previo de tablas.', 'pt': 'As tabelas armazenam dados numéricos ricos, mas o raciocínio numérico sobre as tabelas ainda é um desafio. Neste artigo, descobrimos que a fórmula da planilha, uma linguagem comumente usada para realizar cálculos em valores numéricos em planilhas, é uma supervisão valiosa para o raciocínio numérico em tabelas. Considerando grandes quantidades de planilhas disponíveis na web, propomos o FORTAP, a primeira exploração a alavancar fórmulas de planilhas para pré-treinamento de tabelas. Dois novos objetivos de pré-treinamento auto-supervisionados são derivados de fórmulas, previsão de referência numérica (NRP) e previsão de cálculo numérico (NCP). Embora nossos objetivos propostos sejam genéricos para codificadores, para melhor capturar layouts e estruturas de tabelas de planilhas, o FORTAP é construído sobre TUTA, o primeiro método baseado em transformador para pré-treinamento de tabelas de planilhas com atenção à árvore. O FORTAP supera os métodos de última geração por grandes margens em três conjuntos de dados representativos de previsão de fórmula, resposta a perguntas e classificação de tipo de célula, mostrando o grande potencial de alavancar fórmulas para pré-treinamento de tabela.', 'fr': "Les tableaux stockent des données numériques riches, mais le raisonnement numérique sur les tableaux reste un défi. Dans cet article, nous trouvons que la formule de feuille de calcul, un langage couramment utilisé pour effectuer des calculs sur des valeurs numériques dans des feuilles de calcul, est une supervision précieuse pour le raisonnement numérique dans les tableaux. Compte tenu de la grande quantité de feuilles de calcul disponibles sur le Web, nous proposons FORTAP, la première exploration à tirer parti des formules de tableur pour le pré-apprentissage des tableaux. Deux nouveaux objectifs de pré-entraînement auto-supervisés sont dérivés de formules, la prédiction numérique de référence (PNR) et la prédiction numérique par calcul (NCP). Alors que les objectifs que nous proposons sont génériques pour les encodeurs, afin de mieux saisir les dispositions et les structures des tableaux de feuilles de calcul, FORTAP repose sur TUTA, la première méthode basée sur un transformateur pour le préapprentissage des tableaux de feuilles de calcul avec une attention particulière aux arbres. FORTAP surpasse les méthodes de pointe par de grandes marges sur trois ensembles de données représentatifs de prédiction de formule, de réponse aux questions et de classification des types de cellules, ce qui montre le grand potentiel de l'exploitation des formules pour l'apprentissage préalable des tables.", 'ja': 'テーブルには豊富な数値データが格納されていますが、テーブルを超えた数値推論は依然として課題です。 本稿では，表計算において数値計算を行う際によく用いられる言語である表計算式が，表計算における数値推論の貴重な監督であることを見出した。 Web上で利用可能な大量のスプレッドシートを考慮して、テーブルの事前トレーニングにスプレッドシートの数式を活用する最初の探索であるFORTAPを提案します。 数値参照予測（ NRP ）と数値計算予測（ NCP ）という2つの新規の自己監視型事前トレーニング目標が数式から導き出されます。 提案されている目標はエンコーダの一般的なものですが、スプレッドシートテーブルのレイアウトと構造をよりよくキャプチャするために、FORTAPはTUTAをベースにしています。TUTAは、木の注意を払ってスプレッドシートテーブルをプレトレーニングするための最初の変圧器ベースの方法です。 FORTAPは、数式予測、質問回答、セルタイプ分類の3つの代表的なデータセットで大幅なマージンを得て、最先端の方法を上回り、テーブルの事前トレーニングに数式を活用する大きな可能性を示しています。', 'zh': '表格存储丰数,然对表数推理犹一挑战也。 本文见电子表格公式(一以会计电子表格数者)对表中数直推理之宝也。 念 Web 上可用者多电子表格,臣等议用 FORTAP,此首用电子表格公式表格预训练之原也。 两新自督预训练自公式,数参测(NRP)数直计(NCP)。 虽言向编码器通用,所以更得电子表格布局结构,而FORTAP立于TUTA之上,TUTA一基于变压器之电子表格预训练方法,有木之关注也。 FORTAP占公式、问答、细胞类三代表性之数集上以大优先进之法,显用公式之表格预训练也。', 'hi': 'तालिकाएं समृद्ध संख्यात्मक डेटा संग्रहीत करती हैं, लेकिन तालिकाओं पर संख्यात्मक तर्क अभी भी एक चुनौती है। इस पेपर में, हम पाते हैं कि स्प्रेडशीट सूत्र, स्प्रेडशीट में संख्यात्मक मूल्यों पर गणना करने के लिए एक आमतौर पर उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषा, तालिकाओं में संख्यात्मक तर्क के लिए एक मूल्यवान पर्यवेक्षण है। वेब पर उपलब्ध स्प्रेडशीट की बड़ी मात्रा को ध्यान में रखते हुए, हम FORTAP का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो तालिका प्रीट्रेनिंग के लिए स्प्रेडशीट सूत्रों का लाभ उठाने के लिए पहली खोज है। दो उपन्यास स्व-पर्यवेक्षित प्रीट्रेनिंग उद्देश्यों को सूत्रों, संख्यात्मक संदर्भ भविष्यवाणी (एनआरपी) और संख्यात्मक गणना भविष्यवाणी (एनसीपी) से लिया गया है। जबकि हमारे प्रस्तावित उद्देश्य एन्कोडर के लिए जेनेरिक हैं, स्प्रेडशीट टेबल लेआउट और संरचनाओं को बेहतर ढंग से कैप्चर करने के लिए, FORTAP को TUTA पर बनाया गया है, जो पेड़ के ध्यान के साथ स्प्रेडशीट टेबल प्रीट्रेनिंग के लिए पहली ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित विधि है। FORTAP सूत्र भविष्यवाणी, प्रश्न उत्तर देने और सेल प्रकार वर्गीकरण के तीन प्रतिनिधि डेटासेट पर बड़े मार्जिन द्वारा अत्याधुनिक तरीकों को मात देता है, जो तालिका प्रीट्रेनिंग के लिए सूत्रों का लाभ उठाने की महान क्षमता दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'В таблицах хранятся богатые числовые данные, но численная аргументация за таблицами все еще является проблемой. В этой статье мы обнаруживаем, что формула электронных таблиц, широко используемый язык для выполнения вычислений по числовым значениям в электронных таблицах, является ценным надзором для численного рассуждения в таблицах. Учитывая большое количество электронных таблиц, доступных в Интернете, мы предлагаем FORTAP - первое исследование для использования формул электронных таблиц для предварительной подготовки таблиц. Две новые цели самоконтролируемого предварительного обучения получены из формул, численного эталонного прогнозирования (NRP) и численного расчетного прогнозирования (NCP). Хотя наши предлагаемые цели являются общими для энкодеров, для лучшего захвата макетов и структур таблиц электронных таблиц, FORTAP построен на TUTA, ПЕРВОМ методе предварительного обучения таблиц электронных таблиц на основе трансформаторов с привлечением внимания деревьев. FORTAP превосходит современные методы по большим полям на трех репрезентативных наборах данных прогнозирования формул, ответов на вопросы и классификации типов ячеек, показывая большой потенциал использования формул для предварительной подготовки таблиц.', 'ga': 'Stórálann táblaí sonraí uimhriúla saibhir, ach is dúshlán fós í réasúnaíocht uimhriúil thar táblaí. Sa pháipéar seo, feicimid go bhfuil an fhoirmle scarbhileog, teanga a úsáidtear go coitianta chun ríomh luachanna uimhriúla i scarbhileoga a dhéanamh, ina maoirseacht luachmhar don réasúnaíocht uimhriúil i dtáblaí. Ag cur san áireamh líon mór scarbhileoga atá ar fáil ar an ngréasán, molaimid FORTAP, an chéad iniúchadh chun foirmlí scarbhileog a ghiaráil le haghaidh réamhoiliúint tábla. Díorthaítear dhá chuspóir réamhoiliúna féinmhaoirsithe úra ó fhoirmlí, tuar tagartha uimhriúil (NRP) agus tuar ríomha uimhriúil (NCP). Cé go bhfuil ár gcuspóirí molta cineálacha d’ionchódóirí, chun leagan amach táblaí scarbhileog agus struchtúir a ghabháil níos fearr, tá FORTAP tógtha ar TUTA, an chéad mhodh atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán le haghaidh réamhoiliúint tábla scarbhileog le haird na gcrann. Feidhmíonn FORTAP modhanna úrscothacha le corrlaigh mhóra ar thrí thacar sonraí ionadaíocha de thuar foirmle, freagairt ceisteanna, agus aicmiú cineál cille, ag taispeáint an acmhainneacht mhór a bhaineann le foirmlí giarála le haghaidh réamhoiliúint tábla.', 'hu': 'A táblázatok gazdag numerikus adatokat tárolnak, de a táblák feletti numerikus érvelés továbbra is kihívást jelent. Ebben a tanulmányban megállapítjuk, hogy a táblázatképlet, amely egy általánosan használt nyelv a numerikus értékek számítására táblázatokban, értékes felügyelet a numerikus érveléshez a táblázatokban. Figyelembe véve az interneten elérhető nagy mennyiségű táblázatokat, javasoljuk a FORTAP-ot, amely az első feltárás, amely táblázatképleteket használ a táblázatképzéshez. Két új, önfelügyelt előkészítési cél származik képletekből, a numerikus referencia-előrejelzésből (NRP) és a numerikus számítási előrejelzésből (NCP). Míg javasolt célkitűzéseink általánosak a kódolók számára, a táblázattáblázatok elrendezéseinek és struktúráinak jobb rögzítése érdekében a FORTAP a TUTA-ra épül, amely az első transzformátor alapú módszer a táblázattáblázatok előkészítésére, a fa figyelmével. A FORTAP nagy margókkal felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb módszereket a képlet-előrejelzés, a kérdésválasz és a cellatípusok osztályozása három reprezentatív adathalmazában, bemutatva a táblázatok előkészítéséhez szükséges képletek kihasználásának nagy potenciálját.', 'el': 'Οι πίνακες αποθηκεύουν πλούσια αριθμητικά δεδομένα, αλλά η αριθμητική συλλογιστική πάνω από τους πίνακες εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διαπιστώνουμε ότι ο τύπος υπολογιστικού φύλλου, μια συνήθως χρησιμοποιούμενη γλώσσα για την εκτέλεση υπολογισμών αριθμητικών τιμών σε υπολογιστικά φύλλα, είναι μια πολύτιμη επιτήρηση για την αριθμητική συλλογιστική σε πίνακες. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τις μεγάλες ποσότητες υπολογιστικών φύλλων που διατίθενται στο διαδίκτυο, προτείνουμε την πρώτη εξερεύνηση που θα αξιοποιήσει τύπους υπολογιστικών φύλλων για την προεπιλογή πίνακα. Από τους τύπους, την πρόβλεψη αριθμητικής αναφοράς (NRP) και την πρόβλεψη αριθμητικού υπολογισμού (NCP) προκύπτουν δύο νέοι αυτοεποπτικοί στόχοι προεπιλογής. Ενώ οι προτεινόμενοι στόχοι μας είναι γενικοί για τους κωδικοποιητές, για την καλύτερη καταγραφή των σχεδιασμών και των δομών υπολογιστικών φύλλων, το FORTAP βασίζεται στην TUTA, την πρώτη μέθοδο που βασίζεται στον μετασχηματιστή για την προεπιλογή πίνακα υπολογιστικών φύλλων με προσοχή σε δέντρο. Το FORTAP ξεπερνά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους με μεγάλα περιθώρια σε τρία αντιπροσωπευτικά σύνολα δεδομένων της πρόβλεψης τύπων, της απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις και της ταξινόμησης τύπων κελιών, δείχνοντας τις μεγάλες δυνατότητες χρήσης τύπων για την προεπιλογή πίνακα.', 'it': "Le tabelle memorizzano dati numerici ricchi, ma il ragionamento numerico sulle tabelle è ancora una sfida. In questo articolo, troviamo che la formula del foglio di calcolo, un linguaggio comunemente usato per eseguire calcoli su valori numerici nei fogli di calcolo, è una preziosa supervisione per il ragionamento numerico nelle tabelle. Considerando le grandi quantità di fogli di calcolo disponibili sul web, proponiamo FORTAP, la prima esplorazione per sfruttare le formule dei fogli di calcolo per il pretraining delle tabelle. Due nuovi obiettivi di pre-formazione auto-supervisionati sono derivati dalle formule, la previsione numerica di riferimento (NRP) e la previsione numerica di calcolo (NCP). Mentre i nostri obiettivi proposti sono generici per gli encoder, per catturare meglio i layout e le strutture delle tabelle dei fogli di calcolo, FORTAP è costruito su TUTA, il primo metodo basato su trasformatori per il pretraining delle tabelle dei fogli di calcolo con attenzione agli alberi. FORTAP supera i metodi all'avanguardia con ampi margini su tre set di dati rappresentativi di previsione delle formule, risposta alle domande e classificazione dei tipi di cella, mostrando il grande potenziale di sfruttare le formule per il pretraining delle tabelle.", 'lt': 'lentelėse saugomi daug skaitmeninių duomenų, tačiau skaitmeninis pagrindimas lentelėse vis dar yra iššūkis. Šiame dokumente matome, kad lentelių formulė, paprastai naudojama lentelių skaitmeninių verčių apskaičiavimams atlikti, yra vertinga skaitmeninio pagrįstumo priežiūra lentelėse. Atsižvelgdami į didelį tinklalapyje turimų lentelių kiekį, siūlome FORTAP, pirmąjį tyrimą, kuriuo siekiama suvienodinti lentelių formules stalo išankstiniam mokymui. Dvi nauji savarankiškai prižiūrimi išankstinio mokymo tikslai yra pagrįsti formulėmis, skaitmeninėmis orientacinėmis prognozėmis (NRP) ir skaitmeninėmis skaičiavimo prognozėmis (NCP). Nors mūsų siūlomi tikslai yra bendri koduotojams, siekiant geriau surinkti lentelių lentelių išdėstymus ir struktūras, FORTAP grindžiamas TUTA, pirmuoju transformatoriumi grindžiamu metodu lentelių lentelių išankstiniam mokymui su medžio dėmesiu. FORTAP outperforms state-of-the-art methods by large margins on three representative datasets of formula prediction, question answering, and cell type classification, showing the great potential of leveraging formulas for table pretraining.', 'mk': 'Табелите чуваат богати бројни податоци, но бројното размислување над табелите е сé уште предизвик. Во оваа хартија, откриваме дека формулата за таблички таблици, обично употребен јазик за извршување на пресметки на бројните вредности во табличките таблици, е вреден надзор за бројното размислување во табличките таблици. Со оглед на големите количини таблички таблички достапни на интернет, предложуваме ФОРТАП, првата експериментација која ќе ги искористи формулите за таблички таблички формули за претренирање на масата. Две нови самонадгледувани предобукни цели се извлечени од формули, бројни референциски предвидувања (НРП) и бројни пресметувања (НЦП). И покрај тоа што нашите предложени цели се генерични за кодерите, за подобро да се фатат распоредувањата и структурите на табличките таблички, ФОРТАП е изграден на ТУТА, првиот метод базиран на трансформатори за претренирање на табличките таблички со внимание на дрв ФОРТАП ги надминува најсовремените методи со големи маргини на три репрезентативни податоци за предвидување на формулата, одговор на прашања и класификација на типот на ќелија, покажувајќи го големиот потенцијал на влијание на формулата за претренирање на масата.', 'ms': 'Jadual menyimpan data nombor yang kaya, tetapi alasan nombor di atas jadual masih satu cabaran. Dalam kertas ini, kami mendapati bahawa formula lembaran, bahasa yang biasanya digunakan untuk melakukan pengiraan pada nilai nombor dalam lembaran, adalah pengawasan yang berharga untuk alasan nombor dalam jadual. Mengingat jumlah besar lembaran yang tersedia di web, kami cadangkan FORTAP, eksplorasi pertama untuk menggunakan formula lembaran untuk latihan awal meja. Two novel self-supervised pretraining objectives are derived from formulas, numerical reference prediction (NRP) and numerical calculation prediction (NCP).  While our proposed objectives are generic for encoders, to better capture spreadsheet table layouts and structures, FORTAP is built upon TUTA, the first transformer-based method for spreadsheet table pretraining with tree attention.  FORTAP melampaui kaedah state-of-the-art dengan margin besar pada tiga set data mewakili ramalan formula, jawapan soalan, dan klasifikasi jenis sel, menunjukkan potensi besar penggunaan formula untuk pralatihan jadual.', 'ml': 'ടേബിളുകള്\u200d സമൃദ്ധമായ സംഖ്യ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നു, പക്ഷെ ടേബിലുകളില്\u200d സംഖ്യയുടെ സംഖ്യകള്\u200d ഇപ്പ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സ്പെര്\u200dഷീറ്റ് ഫോര്\u200dമുല, സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ വ്യാപ്തിഷീറ്റുകളിലെ എണ്ണികങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, ടേബിളില വെബ്ബില്\u200d ലഭ്യമായ വ്യാപ്തിഷീറ്റുകളുടെ വലിയ കൂട്ടത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dട്ടാപിനെക്കുറിച്ച് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ് രണ്ടു നോവല്\u200d സ്വയം നിരീക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമുലാകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സംഖ്യ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവചനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും എണ്ണ നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200d കോഡെര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200dക്ക് സാധാരണമാണ്, വ്യാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടേബിള്\u200d ലേയൌട്ടുകളെയും അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളെയും പിടികൂടാന്\u200d  ഫോര്\u200dട്ടാപി മൂന്നു പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റുകളില്\u200d വലിയ മാര്\u200dഗിനുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതിയിലെ രീതിയിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പുറത്ത് വരുത്തുന്നു.', 'mt': 'It-tabelli jaħżnu dejta numerika rikka, iżda r-raġunament numeriku fuq it-tabelli għadu sfida. In this paper, we find that the spreadsheet formula, a commonly used language to perform computations on numerical values in spreadsheets, is a valuable supervision for numerical reasoning in tables.  Meta nikkunsidraw ammonti kbar ta’ spreadsheets disponibbli fuq l-internet, nipproponu FORTAP, l-ewwel esplorazzjoni li tagħti spinta lill-formuli ta’ spreadsheets għat-taħriġ minn qabel fuq il-mejda. Żewġ għanijiet ġodda ta’ qabel it-taħriġ li huma ssorveljati minnhom infushom huma derivati minn formuli, tbassir ta’ referenza numerika (NRP) u tbassir ta’ kalkolu numeriku (NCP). Filwaqt li l-għanijiet proposti tagħna huma ġeneriċi għall-kodifikaturi, biex jinqabdu aħjar it-tqassim u l-istrutturi tal-iskedi tal-iskala, FORTAP huwa mibni fuq TUTA, l-ewwel metodu bbażat fuq it-trasformatur għat-taħriġ minn qabel tal-iskedi tal-iskala bl-attenzjoni tas-siġar. FORTAP jaqbeż il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati b’marġini kbar fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta rappreżentattivi tat-tbassir tal-formula, it-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, u l-klassifikazzjoni tat-tip taċ-ċellola, li juru l-potenzjal kbir ta’ ingranaġġ tal-formuli għat-taħriġ minn qabel tal-mejda.', 'ka': 'ტაბლეები მრიცხველოვანი მონაცემების შენახვა, მაგრამ მრიცხველოვანი მონაცემების გარეშე ცხოვრებაა. ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სწორედ გამოიყენებული ენათი, რიცხვური მნიშვნელობების გამოყენებაში სწორედ გამოყენებული მნიშვნელობების გამოყენებაში, არის მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემული მო გვაქვს დიდი რაოდენობა წილადოები, რომლებიც გვაქვს ვებზე, ჩვენ FORTAP-ს, პირველი განსხვავება, რომელიც წილადოების ფორმულების გამოყენება მაგილის წილადოებისთვის. ორი პრომენური თავიდან დამუშავებული საკუთარი საკუთარი ფორმულებიდან, რიცხვური რეფერმენტის წინასწორება (NRP) და რიცხვური წინასწორება (NCP) დაიწყება. თუმცა ჩვენი მიზეზი კოდერებისთვის გენერიკულია, რომელიც უფრო უფრო აღმოჩენოთ სიახლე და სტრუქტურები, FORTAP იქნება TUTA-ზე, პირველი რენტრუქტურაციის მიზეზი პირველი რესპორქტურა FORTAP გავაკეთება სამი განსაზღვრებულ მონაცემების განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების განსაზღვრების, კითხვების გასაგება და კოლეფიკაციის ტიპის კლასიფიკაციაზე, რომელიც გვეჩვენება უფრო დიდი პონციალური პროგრამი', 'mn': 'Таблицууд баян тооны өгөгдлийг хадгалдаг, гэхдээ хүснэгт дээр тооны шалтгаан нь одоо ч асуудал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүснэгт дээрх тооны утгыг тооцоолох хэлний тооцоололтой тооцоололтой хэлний тооцоололтой хэлний үнэ цэнэтэй байдаг. Веб дээр маш их хэмжээний хуудас баригдаж байгааг ойлгоход бид FORTAP, хүснэгт ширээний ширээний ширээний томъёо ашиглах анхны судалгаа санал болгоно. Хоёр шинэ өөрийгөө удирдаж байгаа хоёр шинэ зорилго нь томъёог, тооны тооны тооцоололт (НРП) болон тооны тооцоололтын тооцоололт (НРП) юм. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн зорилго нь кодчуудын ерөнхий төлөвлөгөө, хуудас ширээний төлөвлөгөө болон бүтцийг илүү сайжруулахын тулд, ФОРТАП ТУТА дээр бий болно. Эхлээд хуудас ширээний анхаарлыг модны анхаарлын төл FORTAP 3 төлөөлөгч өгөгдлийн томъёо таамаглах, асуулт хариулт, эсийн төрлийн хэлбэрийн хуваалтыг харуулж, хүснэгт дамжуулах томъёонуудын хамгийн том боломжуудыг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Tabeller lagrar rike numeriske data, men det er fortsatt eit utfordring over tabeller. I denne papiret finn vi at reknearkformelen, eit vanleg brukt språk for å utføra datamaskina på numeriske verdiar i rekneark, er eit verdileg oversikt for numerisk rasjon i tabeller. I tillegg til store mengda rekneark som er tilgjengelege på nettet, foreslår vi FORTAP, den første utforskinga som skal levera reknearformlane for tabellområde. To romanske sjølvovervåke område er avhengig frå formlar, numeriske referansforhåndsvising (NRP) og numeriske beregningsforhåndsvising (NCP). Selv om våre foreslått mål er generelt for kodarar, for å bestemme oppsett og strukturer av tabellen for rekneark, er FORTAP bygd på TUTA, den første transformeringsmetoden for tabellen for rekneark med treoppmerksomhet. FORTAP utfører tilstanden av kunstmetodar med store marginar på tre reprezentativ datasett av formelforhåndsvising, spørsmålssvar og celletype-klassifikasjon, som viser stor potensial for å leverara formlar for tabellområde.', 'pl': 'Tabele przechowują bogate dane numeryczne, ale rozumowanie numeryczne nad tabelami jest nadal wyzwaniem. W niniejszym artykule stwierdzimy, że formuła arkusza kalkulacyjnego, powszechnie stosowany język do wykonywania obliczeń wartości liczbowych w arkuszach kalkulacyjnych, jest cennym nadzorem rozumowania numerycznego w tabelach. Biorąc pod uwagę duże ilości arkuszy kalkulacyjnych dostępnych w sieci, proponujemy FORTAP, pierwszą eksplorację, która wykorzystuje formuły arkuszy kalkulacyjnych do wstępnego treningu tabel. Na podstawie wzorów, numerycznej predykcji referencyjnej (NRP) i numerycznej predykcji obliczeń (NCP) wywodzą się dwa nowe cele wstępnego treningu pod własnym nadzorem. Podczas gdy nasze proponowane cele są ogólne dla koderów, aby lepiej przechwytywać układy i struktury tabeli arkuszy kalkulacyjnych, FORTAP jest zbudowany na TUTA, pierwszej opartej na transformatorze metody wstępnego treningu tabeli kalkulacyjnych z uwagą drzewa. FORTAP przewyższa najnowocześniejsze metody o duże marginesy na trzech reprezentatywnych zbiorach danych dotyczących przewidywania formuł, odpowiedzi na pytania i klasyfikacji typów komórek, pokazując ogromny potencjał wykorzystania formuł do wstępnego treningu tabeli.', 'ro': 'Tabelele stochează date numerice bogate, dar raționamentul numeric peste tabele este încă o provocare. În această lucrare, constatăm că formula foii de calcul, un limbaj obișnuit utilizat pentru a efectua calcule pe valori numerice în foi de calcul, este o supraveghere valoroasă pentru raționamentul numeric în tabele. Având în vedere cantitățile mari de foi de calcul disponibile pe web, vă propunem FORTAP, prima explorare care utilizează formule de foi de calcul pentru pregătirea meselor. Două obiective noi de pregătire auto-supravegheate sunt derivate din formule, predicția de referință numerică (PNR) și predicția calculului numeric (NCP). În timp ce obiectivele propuse sunt generice pentru codificatori, pentru a capta mai bine aspectele și structurile tabelului de calcul, FORTAP este construit pe TUTA, prima metodă bazată pe transformator pentru pregătirea tabelului de calcul cu atenție la copac. FORTAP depășește metodele de ultimă generație prin marje mari pe trei seturi de date reprezentative de predicție a formulelor, răspuns la întrebări și clasificare a tipurilor de celule, arătând potențialul mare de utilizare a formulelor pentru pregătirea tabelului.', 'kk': 'Қойындылар сандарды бағалау, бірақ сандарды кестелердің үстінде тәуелді. Бұл қағазда, кестелердегі сандарды есептеу үшін көпшілік қолданылатын кестелердің таңбаларының формулы, таңбалардың сандарды түсініктеу үшін мәні бақылады. Интернетте жеткізетін кестелердің формулаларын қолдану үшін FORTAP дегенді, кестелердің алғашқы кестелердің формулаларын қолдану үшін бірінші зерттеу керек. Екі романдық өзінің қарағандарын қарау мақсаттары формуладан, сандық сілтемелер (НRP) және сандық есептеу (NCP) бағдарламадан шығарылады. Біздің келтірілген мақсаттарымыз кодерлер үшін жалпы, кестелер кестелерін және құрылымызды жақсы түсіру үшін, FORTAP TUTA- ға құрылады, кестелер кестесінің бірінші түріндіру тәсілі, ағаш бойынша қара FORTAP үш келтірілген деректер қорларының үш таңдау, сұрақ жауап беру және ұяшық түрінің классификациясының үлкен шектері арқылы күй- жай әдістерін шектеп береді. Кесте тұру үшін үлкен формулаларды шект', 'sr': 'Tablete čuvaju bogate brojne podatke, ali brojno razmišljanje o stolovima još uvijek je izazov. U ovom papiru nalazimo da je formula računala, često korišćena jezika za izvršavanje računala na brojnim vrijednostima u računala, vrijedna nadzor za brojne razmišljanje u tablama. S obzirom na velike količine računala koje su dostupne na internetu, predlažemo FORTAP, prvo istraživanje za primjenu formula računala za pregled stola. Два нова само-надзорна цела претензирана се изводе из форма, бројичне предвидење референције (НРП) и предвидења бројичних расчета (НЦП). Iako su naši predloženi ciljevi generični za kodere, da bi bolje uhvatili raspored stola i strukture, FORTAP je izgrađen na TUTA-u, prvi metod transformatora za raspored stola koji se pretvara sa pažnjom drveta. FORTAP iznosi metode države umjetnosti velikim marginama na tri predviđanja predstavnika podataka formule, odgovora na pitanja i klasifikaciju tipa stanica, pokazujući veliki potencijal primjene formula za pretvaranje stola.', 'si': 'ටේබ්ල් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක දත්ත සංරක්ෂා කරනවා, නමුත් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් තාමත මේ පැත්තේ, අපි හොයාගන්නේ ස්ප්\u200dරේඩ්ෂිට් සූමාලය, සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක් ස්ප්\u200dරේඩ්ෂිට් වල සංඛාණාත්මක විශේෂණ වල පරීක්ෂණ වෙබ් එකේ ලොකු ස්ප්\u200dරේඩ්ෂිට් වලට පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් ස්ප්\u200dරේඩ්ෂිට් වලට බලන්න, අපි පළමු ස්ප්\u200dරේඩ්ෂිට් සූමාණ වලට ප්\u200d සංවිධාන ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක අරමුණ දෙකක් තියෙනවා, සංවිධාන සංවිධානය (NRP) සහ අපේ සැලසුම් අක්ෂේත්වය සාමාන්\u200dය සංකේතකයෙන්, ස්ප්\u200dරේඩ්ෂිට් මේස් වින්යාස සහ සංවිධානය සඳහා හොඳට අල්ලගන්න, ප්\u200dරේඩ්ෂිට් වින්යාස කරන ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස, ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර, සහ කෝෂි වර්ගයක් විශ්වාස කරන විශේෂය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විශ', 'so': "Jardiyadu waxay ku haystaan macluumaad aad u badan, laakiin sababta tiro badan ee looxyada ku qoran weli waa dhibaato. Warqadan waxaynu ka heleynaa in foomka sheekada lagu kala firdhiyo, luqada caadiga ah oo lagu isticmaalayo in lagu sameeyo xisaabta qiimaha tirada ah oo lagu qoro sheekada, waa ilaaliye qiimo qiimaha ah oo looxyada ku qoran sababo tiro badan. Intaan ka fiirsanayno sheekado badan oo webka laga heli karo, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa FORTAP, baaritaanka ugu horeysa ee ugu horraysa qoraalka sheekada lagu fidiyo oo lagu soo daabaco miiska. Laba warqadood oo la ilaaliyo oo la soo jeedo jimicsiga roobka waxaa laga keenaa formulaha, prediction numeric reference (NRP) iyo prediction xisaabitaanka numeric (NCP). Inta lagu sameeyo waxyaabaheennu ay tahay mid caadi ah codcodsiga, si aad ugu fiican u qabsato miiska lagu fidiyo iyo dhismaha, FORTAP waxaa lagu dhisay TUTA, qaabka ugu horeeya beddelinta miiska lagu beddelayo oo lagu sii jeedayo geed attention. FORTAP wuxuu soo saaraa hababka farshaxanta ah oo ku yaala saddex koox oo macluumaad ah oo ka mid ah saddex qof oo ka mid ah wax la sii sheegayo, jawaabta su'aalka, iyo fasaxa cayimanta qoyska, wuxuuna tusaa awoodda weyn oo u badan in loo soo dhiibo foomka tababarka lagu soo daayo.", 'sv': 'Tabeller lagrar rika numeriska data, men numeriskt resonemang över tabeller är fortfarande en utmaning. I denna uppsats finner vi att kalkylbladsformeln, ett vanligt språk för att utföra beräkningar av numeriska värden i kalkylblad, är en värdefull handledning för numeriskt resonemang i tabeller. Med tanke på stora mängder kalkylblad som finns tillgängliga på webben föreslår vi FORTAP, den första utforskningen för att utnyttja kalkylformler för tabellförberedning. Två nya självövervakade pre-trainingmål härleds från formler, numerisk referensprediktion (NRP) och numerisk beräkningsprocess (NCP). Medan våra föreslagna mål är generella för kodare, för att bättre fånga tabelllayouter och strukturer för kalkylblad, är FORTAP byggt på TUTA, den första transformatorbaserade metoden för kalkylblad tabellförbehandling med träduppmärksamhet. FORTAP överträffar toppmoderna metoder med stora marginaler på tre representativa datauppsättningar av formelprognoser, frågesvar och celltypsklassificering, vilket visar den stora potentialen med att utnyttja formler för tabellförberedning.', 'ur': 'ٹیبلز مالدار شماری ڈیٹا کو ذخیره کرتے ہیں، لیکن ٹیبلز پر شماری دلیل بھی ایک چال ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ اسپرڈشٹ فرمول، اسپرڈشٹ میں شماری مقداروں پر کمپیوٹر کرنے کے لئے ایک معتبر زبان ہے جو ٹیبل میں شماری منظورات کے لئے ہے۔ ویب میں بہت سی اسپرڈ شیٹ موجود ہوتے ہیں، ہم FORTAP کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، پہلے اسپرڈ شیٹ فرمول کو ٹیبل پررینٹ کے لئے استعمال کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرنے کے لئے. دو روزنامہ اپنے اوپر نظر کیا گیا تھا، فرمول، شماری فرمول پیش بینی (NRP) اور شماری محاسبہ پیش بینی (NCP) سے آئے گئے ہیں۔ اگرچہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی موجودات کوڈر کے لئے عمومی ہیں، اسپرڈشٹ ٹیبل لئائیوں اور ساختاروں کو اچھی طرح پکڑنے کے لئے، فورتاپ TUTA پر بنایا گیا ہے، اسپرڈشٹ ٹیبل کے لئے پہلی تغییر دینے کا طریقہ ہے جو درخت کی توجه سے پرٹرین فرمول کی پیش بینی، سوال جواب، اور سلول کی طرح کلاسپیٹ سے زیادہ استعمال کرتا ہے، یعنی تین نمایشن ڈیٹسٹ کے تین نمایشن ڈیٹسٹ کے ذریعہ سے بہت بڑے اندازے سے استعمال کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'அட்டவணைகள் பழைய எண்ணிக்கை தரவை சேமிக்கவும், ஆனால் அட்டவணைகளில் எண்ணிக்கையான காரணங்கள் இன்னும் ஒரு சவா இந்த காகிதத்தில், விரித்தாள் வடிவமைப்பு பொதுவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மொழி விரிதாள்களில் எண்ணிக்கை மதிப்புகளை செய்ய பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது,  இணையத்தில் கிடைக்கும் விரித்தாள்கள் பெரிய எண்ணிக்கையை கருத்து, நாம் FORTAP, அட்டவணை முன்னோட்டு விரிதாள் வடிவமைப்பு இரண்டு புதிய தன்னியக்க கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட பொருள்கள் வடிவமைப்புகளிலிருந்து, எண்ணிக்கை குறிப்பு முன்னேற்றம் (NRP) மற்ற எங்கள் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட பொருள்கள் குறியீடுகளுக்கு பொதுவாக இருக்கும் போது, விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட அட்டவணை உருவரைகள் மற்றும் அமைப்புகளை சிறந்த பிடிக்க, FOR FORTAP மூன்று பிரதிநிதிய தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் பெரிய முறைமையான முறைகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, கேள்வி பதில், மற்றும் அறை வகைப்புகள் வகைப்படுத்தல், அட்டவணை முன்னோட்டமைப', 'uz': "@ info Ushbu qogʻozda, elektron varagʻi formula, oddiy soni cheksiz qiymatlarni bajarish uchun ishlatiladigan tillar, jadvaldagi raqamli sabablar uchun qiymatni boshqarish mumkin. Veb- sahifadagi katta tarkib sahifalar haqida, biz FORTAP, jadvalning oldinga jadvalni koʻpaytirish uchun birinchi qidirish mumkin. Name Kodlash usullari oddiy kodlash usuli, ajratuvchi jadvalning tarkibi va structurlarini ajratish uchun yaxshi darajada, FORTAP TUTA'da yaratiladi, daraxt paydo bo'lgan ajratish jadvalning birinchi oʻzgarish usuli. Name", 'vi': 'Bài ca lưu trữ dữ liệu số lượng, nhưng việc lập luận số trên bảng vẫn là một thách thức. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi thấy rằng công thức tờ tính, một ngôn ngữ thường dùng để thực hiện tính trên các giá trị số trong bảng tính, là một sự giám sát giá trị cho việc tính to án trong các bảng. Dựa vào lượng lớn bảng tính có sẵn trên mạng, chúng tôi đề nghị CHTAP, cuộc thám hiểm đầu tiên để thu thập các công thức biểu đồ cho buổi to án bảng xếp. Hai mục tiêu sản xuất trước mắt được giám sát mới được phân phát từ các công thức, dự đoán số tham khảo (NRP) và dự đoán số má (NCP). Trong khi những mục tiêu đề nghị của chúng ta là chung với bộ mã hóa, để thu thập tốt hơn các biểu đồ và cấu trúc bảng tính, luôn luôn sẵn sàng để phục vụ cho kiểu chuyển đổi đầu tiên cho bảng tính với sự chú ý của cây. VTAP vượt trội các phương pháp hiện đại bằng cách lợi nhuận lớn trên ba bộ dữ liệu đại diện về dự đoán công thức, câu hỏi trả lời, và phân loại tế bào, hiển thị khả năng lớn của việc thao túng công thức cho việc tính toán trước bảng.', 'bg': 'Таблиците съхраняват богати цифрови данни, но числовото разсъждаване върху таблиците все още е предизвикателство. В тази статия откриваме, че формулата за електронни таблици, често използван език за извършване на изчисления на числови стойности в електронни таблици, е ценен надзор за числено разсъждаване в таблици. Предвид големите количества електронни таблици, налични в интернет, предлагаме първото проучване за използване на формули за електронни таблици за предварително обучение на таблици. От формулите се извличат две нови цели, които се самоконтролират преди обучението, числено референтно прогнозиране (НКП) и числено изчисление (НКП). Докато предложените ни цели са общи за кодери, за по-добро улавяне на оформления и структури на таблици, ФОРТАП е изграден върху първия трансформаторен метод за предварително обучение на таблици с внимание на дървото. Фортап превъзхожда най-съвременните методи с големи маржове на три представителни набора от данни за прогнозиране на формули, отговор на въпроси и класификация на типа клетки, показвайки големия потенциал за използване на формули за предтрениране на таблица.', 'nl': 'Tabellen slaan rijke numerieke gegevens op, maar numerieke redenering over tabellen is nog steeds een uitdaging. In dit artikel vinden we dat de spreadsheetformule, een veelgebruikte taal om berekeningen uit te voeren op numerieke waarden in spreadsheets, een waardevol toezicht is voor numerieke redenering in tabellen. Gezien grote hoeveelheden spreadsheets beschikbaar op het web, stellen we FORTAP voor, de eerste verkenning om spreadsheetformules te gebruiken voor tabelpretraining. Twee nieuwe zelfbegeleide pretraining doelstellingen worden afgeleid van formules, numerieke referentievoorspelling (NRP) en numerieke berekening voorspelling (NCP). Hoewel onze voorgestelde doelstellingen generiek zijn voor encoders, om lay-outs en structuren van spreadsheets beter vast te leggen, is FORTAP gebouwd op TUTA, de eerste transformator-gebaseerde methode voor pretraining van spreadsheets met aandacht voor bomen. FORTAP overtreft state-of-the-art methoden met grote marges op drie representatieve datasets van formule voorspelling, vragenantwoord en celtype classificatie, wat het grote potentieel toont van het gebruik van formules voor tabel pretraining.', 'hr': 'Tablete čuvaju bogate brojne podatke, ali brojni razgovor preko tablica još uvijek je izazov. U ovom papiru nalazimo da je formula računala, često korišćena jezika za izračunavanje brojnih vrijednosti u računala, vrijedna nadzor za brojne razmišljanje u tablama. S obzirom na velike količine računalnih ploča dostupnih na internetu, predlažemo FORTAP, prvo istraživanje za primjenu formula računalnih ploča za pregled stola. Dva novog cilja pregledavanja vlastitog nadzora nalaze se iz formula, brojnih predviđanja referencija (NRP) i predviđanja brojnih računa (NCP). Iako su naši predloženi ciljevi generični za kodere, da bi bolje uhvatili raspored i strukture tablica, FORTAP je izgrađen na TUTA-u, prvi način transformacije za tablu rasporeda koji se pretvara s pažnjom drveta. FORTAP iznosi metode stanja umjetnosti velikim mjerilima na tri predviđanja predviđanja predstavnika podataka formule, odgovora na pitanja i klasifikaciju tipa stanica, pokazujući veliki potencijal primjene formula za predviđanje stolice.', 'da': 'Tabeller gemmer rige numeriske data, men numerisk ræsonnement over tabeller er stadig en udfordring. I denne artikel finder vi, at regnearksformlen, et almindeligt brugt sprog til at udføre beregninger på numeriske værdier i regneark, er et værdifuldt tilsyn med numerisk ræsonnement i tabeller. I betragtning af store mængder regneark, der er tilgængelige på nettet, foreslår vi FORTAP, den første udforskning til at udnytte regnearksformler til tabelforuddannelse. To nye selvovervågede forudtræningsmål er afledt af formler, numerisk reference forudsigelse (NRP) og numerisk beregning forudsigelse (NCP). Mens vores foreslåede mål er generiske for kodere, er FORTAP bygget på TUTA, den første transformer-baserede metode til regneark tabel forudtræning med træopmærksomhed for bedre at fange regneark tabel layout og strukturer. FORTAP udfører avancerede metoder med store marginer på tre repræsentative datasæt af formel forudsigelse, spørgsmål besvarelse og celletypeklassificering, hvilket viser det store potentiale ved at udnytte formler til tabel foruddannelse.', 'id': 'Tabel menyimpan data numerik kaya, tapi alasan numerik di atas tabel masih tantangan. Dalam kertas ini, kami menemukan bahwa formula lembaran, bahasa yang biasanya digunakan untuk melakukan perhitungan pada nilai numerik dalam lembaran, adalah pengawasan yang berharga untuk alasan numerik di tabel. Mengingat jumlah besar lembaran yang tersedia di web, kami mengusulkan FORTAP, eksplorasi pertama untuk mengambil alih formula lembaran untuk pralatihan meja. Dua tujuan awal pengawasan diri yang baru didirikan dari formula, prediksi referensi numerik (NRP) dan prediksi kalkulasi numerik (NCP). Sementara tujuan kami yang diusulkan adalah generik untuk pengekode, untuk menangkap lebih baik layout tabel tabel dan struktur, FORTAP dibangun pada TUTA, metode pertama berdasarkan transformer untuk tabel tabel pretraining dengan perhatian pohon. FORTAP melebihi metode state-of-the-art dengan margin besar pada tiga dataset mewakili prediksi formula, jawaban pertanyaan, dan klasifikasi tipe sel, menunjukkan potensi besar penggunaan formula untuk prediksi meja.', 'de': 'Tabellen speichern umfangreiche numerische Daten, aber numerische Argumentation über Tabellen ist immer noch eine Herausforderung. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir fest, dass die Tabellenkalkulationsformel, eine häufig verwendete Sprache, um Berechnungen von numerischen Werten in Tabellenkalkulationen durchzuführen, eine wertvolle Überwachung für numerische Argumentation in Tabellen ist. In Anbetracht der großen Mengen an Tabellenkalkulationen, die im Web verfügbar sind, schlagen wir FORTAP vor, die erste Exploration, um Tabellenkalkulationsformulen für die Tabellenvorbereitung zu nutzen. Zwei neuartige selbstüberwachte Vortrainingsziele werden aus Formeln abgeleitet, numerische Referenzvorhersage (NRP) und numerische Berechnungsprädiktion (NCP). Während unsere vorgeschlagenen Ziele generisch für Encoder sind, um Tabellenlayouts und -strukturen besser zu erfassen, basiert FORTAP auf TUTA, der ersten transformatorbasierten Methode für Tabellenvorbereitung mit Baumaufmerksamkeit. FORTAP übertrifft modernste Methoden mit großen Margen auf drei repräsentativen Datensätzen der Formelprädiktion, Frageantwort und Zelltypklassifizierung und zeigt das große Potenzial der Verwendung von Formeln für die Tabellenvorbereitung.', 'fa': 'Tables store rich numerical data, but numerical reasoning over tables is still a challenge. در این کاغذ، ما فهمیدیم که فرمول صفحه حساب، یک زبان معمولاً استفاده شده برای انجام محاسبات در ارزش شماره\u200cها در صفحه\u200cهای حساب، یک نظارت ارزشمند برای منطق شماره\u200cای در میز است. با توجه به تعداد زیادی از صفحه\u200cهای صفحه\u200cای که در وب موجود هستند، ما FORTAP را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، اولین کشف\u200cبندی که فرمول\u200cهای صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cی صفحه\u200cها را برای پیشنهاد کردن دو هدف تغییر کنترل خودکنترل روانی از فرمول، پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط شماری (NRP) و پیش\u200cبینی محاسبه\u200cهای شماری (NCP) است. در حالی که هدف پیشنهاد ما برای کودکان\u200cها معمولی هستند، برای بهتر برنامه\u200cهای میز و ساختارهای صفحه\u200cهای صفحه\u200cها، FORTAP روی TUTA ساخته می\u200cشود، اولین روش تغییر\u200cدهنده برای میز صفحه\u200cهای صفحه\u200cها که با توجه درخت تغییر می\u200c FORTAP روش\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را با مرز بزرگ بر سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای نمایش\u200cکننده\u200cی پیش\u200cبینی فرمول، جواب سوال و کلاسیک نوع سلول انجام می\u200cدهد، نشان می\u200cدهد پتانسیل بزرگی فرمول\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده برای تغییر کردن میز.', 'ko': '표는 풍부한 수치 데이터를 저장하지만, 표에 대해 수치 추리를 하는 것은 여전히 도전이다.본고에서 우리는 전자 표 공식은 전자 표에서 수치를 계산하는 데 자주 사용하는 언어로 표 속의 수치 추리에 대해 가치 있는 감독이라는 것을 발견했다.인터넷에 대량의 사용 가능한 전자 표가 있다는 것을 감안하여 우리는 FORTAP을 제기했는데 이것은 처음으로 전자 표 공식을 이용하여 표 예훈련을 하는 탐색이다.공식에서 두 가지 새로운 자체 감독 예비 훈련 목표인 수치 참조 예보(NRP)와 수치 계산 예보(NCP)를 도출했다.우리가 제시한 목표는 인코더에 통용되지만 전자 표의 구조와 구조를 더욱 잘 포착하기 위해 FORTAP는 TUTA를 바탕으로 하고 TUTA는 변환기를 바탕으로 하는 첫 번째 전자 표 예훈련 방법으로 트리 주의를 가진다.FORTAP은 공식 예측, 질문 응답, 단원 유형 분류 등 세 가지 대표적인 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 방법보다 훨씬 우수한 모습을 보이며 공식을 이용하여 표 예행 훈련을 하는 커다란 잠재력을 보여준다.', 'sw': 'Mikondo inabeba takwimu zenye tajiri za tarakimu, lakini maana kadhaa juu ya meza bado ni changamoto. In this paper, we find that the spreadsheet formula, a commonly used language to perform computations on numerical values in spreadsheets, is a valuable supervision for numerical reasoning in tables.  Kwa kuzingatia kiasi kikubwa cha maeneo yanayopatikana kwenye mtandao wa intaneti, tunapendekeza FORTAP, utafiti wa kwanza kwa ajili ya formula za usambazaji kwa ajili ya kutengeneza meza. Lengo mbili za riwaya zinazofuatiliwa kwa kujitazama zinatokana na miundo mbili, utabiri wa maoni kadhaa (NRP) na utabiri wa hesabu kadhaa (NCP). Wakati malengo yetu yanayopendekezwa ni ya kawaida kwa ajili ya kuweka kodi, ili kupata vifaa vyema vya meza na miundombinu, FORTAP imejengwa kwenye TUTA, njia ya kwanza ya mabadiliko kwa ajili ya meza ya kusambaza kwa ajili ya kuonyesha miti. FORTAP inaonyesha uwezekano mkubwa wa kutuma miundo ya sanaa kwa ajili ya utabiri wa takwimu tatu za uwakilishi wa utabiri wa formula, majibu ya maswali na aina ya aina ya simu za mkononi, kuonyesha uwezekano mkubwa wa kutuma mipango kwa ajili ya matumizi ya meza.', 'tr': "Täbler baý sany maglumatlary goraýar, ýöne sany sebäpler täblisaň üstünde bir kynçylyk bar. Bu kagyzda, biz çapdaky çapdaky formulada, sany çapdaky mykdarlar üzerinde hesaplamak üçin ullanýan dil tapýarys, täbliklerde näçe razylyk üçin bir nähili gözetim bar. Web üzerinde mevcut kalamlar takmynana gelip, FORTAP'y, tabel önlemek üçin ilkinji çapçilik formüllerini etkinleştirmek üçin bir gezek teklif ediyoruz. Iki roman özüni gözetleýän önünlik maksady formalardan, sanal Reference prediction (NRP) we sayyk hasaplama öňünden döredildi. Biziň teklip eden maksadlarymyz ködler üçin jeneral bolsa, çapdaky täblisaň düzümlerini we düzümlerini gowy almak üçin, FORTAP TUTA'da guruldy, we çapdaky täblisaň üçin birinji täblisaň tabanly täblisaň derejesi üçin agaç ünsü bilen süýtgeden t FORTAP 3 temsilci veri toplamının önlemi, sorgular cevap vermesi ve hücre türü klasifikasyonunda büyük bir şekilde sunucu yöntemlerini gösterir.", 'sq': 'Tabelat ruajnë të dhëna numerike të pasura, por arsyetimi numerik mbi tabela është ende një sfidë. Në këtë letër, gjejmë se formula e tabelave, një gjuhë e përdorur zakonisht për të kryer llogaritje mbi vlerat numerike në tabela, është një mbikqyrje e vlefshme për arsyetimin numerik në tabela. Duke konsideruar sasi të mëdha tabelash në dispozicion në internet, ne propozojmë FORTAP, eksplorimi i parë për të përdorur formulat e tabelash për parastërvitjen e tavolinës. Dy objektiva të reja të vetë-mbikqyrura të parastërvitjes janë të nxjerra nga formulat, parashikimi numerik i referimit (NRP) dhe parashikimi numerik i llogaritjeve (NCP). Ndërsa objektivat tona të propozuara janë gjenerike për koduesit, për të kapur më mirë renditjet dhe strukturat e tabelave të tabelave, FORTAP është ndërtuar mbi TUTA, metoda e parë e bazuar në transformues për tabelat e tabelave të predraining me vëmendje druri. FORTAP kalon metodat më të larta me marxhe të mëdha në tre grupe përfaqësuese të dhënash të parashikimit të formulave, përgjigjen e pyetjeve dhe klasifikimin e llojit të qelizave, duke treguar potencialin e madh të përdorimit të formulave për parastërvitjen e tabelës.', 'af': "Tabelle stoor ryk numeriese data, maar numeriese redening oor tabelle is nog 'n uitdrukking. In hierdie papier, vind ons dat die spreadsheet formule, 'n gewoonlik gebruik taal om rekenaar te doen op numeriese waardes in spreadsheet, is 'n waardelike supervisie vir numeriese redening in tabelle. Aangaande groot hoeveelheid spreadsheet beskikbaar op die web, voorstel ons FORTAP, die eerste uitsoek om spreadsheet formule vir tabel voorskrywing te verwyder. Twee novele self-superviseer voorwerp is van formule afgelei, numeriese verwysing voorwerp (NRP) en numeriese berekening voorwerp (NCP). Alhoewel ons voorgestelde objekte genereek is vir enkoderers, om beter spreadsheet tabel uitlegte en strukture te vang, word FORTAP gebou op TUTA, die eerste transformer-gebaseerde metode vir spreadsheet tabel voorreen met boom aandag. FORTAP uitvoer state-of-the-art metodes deur groot marjinse op drie reprezentante datastelle van formule voorskou, vraag antwoord en sel tipe klasifikasie, wys die groot potensieal van verwysing formule vir tabel voorskou.", 'am': 'ሠንጠረዥዎች የሀብታም ቁጥር ዳታዎችን ያቆማሉ፥ ነገር ግን በሠንጠረዥዎች ላይ የአካባቢ ምክንያት ገና የጥላቻ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የዘርፍ ደረጃው ፎርማሌ፣ በተጨማሪው የቁጥር ግምገማዎች ቁጥጥር ለመፈለግ የሚጠቀሙት ቋንቋ፣ በጽሑፎች ውስጥ የአካባቢ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በweb ላይ የተገኘውን የዘርፍ ክፍሎች በተለያዩ ጊዜ የፎርታፕን መጀመሪያ ምርጫዎች ለገበታው ፊደል መዝገብ ማሳየት ለመጀመሪያ መፍጠር እናስጀምራለን፡፡ የሁለት አቀማመጥ አቃውንቶች ከፎርማሎቹ፣ የቁጥር መልዕክት (NRP) እና የቁጥጥር ቁጥጥር ቅድሚያ (NCP) ሆኗል፡፡ በተዘጋጀ አቃላዎች የሆኑት አካባቢዎች የሆኑት የጽሑፍ ገበታ እቅድ እና መሠረቶችን ለመያዝ ብሔራዊ አካባቢዎች ሲሆኑ፣ የዛፍ ተጠቃሚዎች በመጀመሪያው ለውጦ-መተላለፊያ ሥርዓት በTUTA ላይ ተሠርቷል፡፡ FORTAP የ-የ-የ-art ሥርዓት በሦስት የፓርቲካ የዳታ መፍትሄቶችን፣ የጥያቄ መልስ እና የcell ዓይነት ክፍሎች ላይ በታላቅ ስርዓት ለገበታው ቅድሚያ ማሳየትን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Tabeller zengin sayı verilənləri yığır, amma sayı dəyişiklik səbəbdir. Bu kağızda, hesap çizgisinin formülünün, hesap çizgisində hesap çəkilmək üçün çoxluğu istifadə edilən dili, sayısal fikirləşmək üçün qiymətli bir gözləyirik. İnternetdə mövcud olan böyük hesap kağıtlarını düşünürək, FORTAP təklif edirik, masa önlənməsi üçün hesap kağıtlarının formüllərini istifadə etmək üçün ilk keşif təklif edirik. İki yeni özünün gözləyirləndirilən tədbir məqsədiləri formüllərdən, sayısal referans tədbir tədbir (NRP) və sayısal hesablama tədbir (NCP) tədbir edilir. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz məqsədilərimiz kodlayıcılar üçün generik olsa da, hesap çubuğunu və strukturları daha yaxşı yakalamaq üçün FORTAP TUTA üstündə inşa edilir, ilk dəyişiklik çubuğu çubuğu ilə ağac gözləyir. FORTAP üç temsilci verilən formül tədbir, sual cavab vermək və hücre türünün klasifikasiyasından böyük sərhədlər ilə müəyyən edir. Bütün formül tədbir etmək üçün böyük potensialını göstərir.', 'hy': 'Tables store rich numerical data, but numerical reasoning over tables is still a challenge.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ աղյուսաթղթի բանաձևը, սովորաբար օգտագործված լեզուն աղյուսաթղթի թվային արժեքների հաշվարկների կատարման համար, արժեքավոր վերահսկում է թվային մտածողության համար: Եթե հաշվի առնենք մեծ քանակությամբ էլեկտրոնային աղյուսակներ, մենք առաջարկում ենք ՖորՏԱՊ-ը, առաջին ուսումնասիրությունը, որպեսզի օգտագործենք աղյուսակների ձևերը սեղանի նախապատրաստման համար: Երկու նոր ինքնավերահսկվող նախավարժման նպատակ կազմված է բանաձևերից, թվային հաղորդակցման կանխատեսումից (ՆՌՊ) և թվային հաշվարկների կանխատեսումից (ՆՌՊ). Մինչդեռ մեր առաջարկած նպատակներն ընդհանուր են կոդերների համար, ավելի լավ ընկալելու աղյուսակի սեղանի դիզայները և կառուցվածքները, ՖորՏԱՊ-ը կառուցվում է ԹՈՏԱ-ի վրա, առաջին աղյուսակի սեղանի վերադասավորման հիմնված մեթոդը ծառերի ուշա ՖորՏԱՊ-ը գերազանցում է ամենահետաքրքիր մեթոդները մեծ արժեքներով բանաձևերի կանխատեսման, հարցերի պատասխանի և բջջային տեսակի դասակարգումների երեք ներկայացուցիչ տվյալների վրա, ցույց տալով սեղանի նախապատրաստման բանաձևերի հսկայական պոտեն', 'bn': 'টেবিল সমৃদ্ধ সংখ্যাগরিক তথ্য সংরক্ষণ করে, কিন্তু টেবিলের উপর সংখ্যাগরিক কারণ এখনো একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ। In this paper, we find that the spreadsheet formula, a commonly used language to perform computations on numerical values in spreadsheets, is a valuable supervision for numerical reasoning in tables.  ওয়েবে প্রাপ্ত বিশাল পরিমাণ বিবেচনা করে আমরা ফোর্টাপ পি প্রস্তাব করি, টেবিলের প্রাকদর্শনের জন্য প্রথম বিভিন্ন বিস্তারিত বিস্তার দুই নভেল নিজেকে পর্যবেক্ষণ করা বৃষ্টির উদ্দেশ্য ফর্মুলা, সংখ্যাত রেফারেন্স ভবিষ্যৎবাণী (NRP) এবং সংখ্যাগরিক গণনা ভবিষ্যৎবাণী  যদিও আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত উদ্দেশ্য এনকোডারের জন্য সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে, স্প্রেস্টেশিট টেবিলেট বিন্যাস এবং কাঠামো গ্রামের মনোযোগ দিয়ে বৃক্ষের প্রথম পরি ফর্মুলা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী, প্রশ্নের উত্তর এবং মোবাইল ধরনের ক্লাসাফিকেশনে বিশাল প্রতিনিধিত্বের তিনটি প্রতিনিধি ডাটাসেটের বিশাল মার্গিনের মাধ্যমে ফোর্টাপ', 'cs': 'Tabulky ukládají bohatá číselná data, ale numerické uvažování nad tabulkami je stále výzvou. V tomto článku zjišťujeme, že tabulkový vzorec, běžně používaný jazyk pro provádění výpočtů číselných hodnot v tabulkách, je cenným dohledem pro numerické uvažování v tabulkách. Vzhledem k velkému množství tabulek dostupných na webu navrhujeme FORTAP, první průzkum využívající tabulkové vzorce pro předškolení tabulek. Z vzorců, numerické referenční predikce (NRP) a numerické predikce výpočtu (NCP) jsou odvozeny dva nové cíle předběžného tréninku pod vlastním dohledem. Zatímco naše navrhované cíle jsou obecné pro snímače, pro lepší zachycení rozložení tabulek a struktur je FORTAP postaven na TUTA, první transformátorové metodě pro předškolení tabulek s pozorností stromu. FORTAP překonává nejmodernější metody o velké okraje na třech reprezentativních datových sadách predikce vzorců, odpovědi na otázky a klasifikace typů buněk, což ukazuje velký potenciál využití vzorců pro předškolení tabulky.', 'bs': 'Tablete čuvaju bogate brojne podatke, ali brojni razgovor preko stolova još uvijek je izazov. U ovom papiru, smatramo da je formula računala, često korišćena jezika za izvršavanje računala na brojnim vrijednostima u računala, vrijedna nadzor za brojne razmišljanje u tablama. S obzirom na velike količine računala dostupnih na internetu, predlažemo FORTAP, prvo istraživanje za primjenu formula računala za pregled stola. Dva novog cilja samopouzdanja predviđena su iz formula, brojnih predviđanja referencija (NRP) i predviđanja brojnih proračuna (NCP). Iako su naši predloženi ciljevi generični za kodere, da bi bolje uhvatili raspored stola i strukture, FORTAP je izgrađen na TUTA-u, prvi metod na transformaciji za tablu rasporeda koji se pretvara sa pažnjom drveta. FORTAP nadmaže metode države umjetnosti velikim marginama na tri predviđanja predstavnika podataka formule, odgovora na pitanja i klasifikaciju tipa stanica, pokazujući veliki potencijal primjene formula za pretvaranje stolice.', 'ca': "Les taules emmagatzeman dades numèriques rics, però el raonament numèric sobre les taules encara és un repte. En aquest paper, trobem que la fórmula de fàgines de taula, una llengua comunament utilitzada per fer calculs sobre valors numbèrics en fàgines de taula, és una supervisió valiosa per al raonament numbèric en les taules. Tenint en compte les grans quantitats de taules disponibles a la web, proposem FORTAP, la primera exploració per aprofitar fórmules de taules per a pré-treinar taules. Two novel self-supervised pretraining objectives are derived from formulas, numerical reference prediction (NRP) and numerical calculation prediction (NCP).  Mentre que els nostres objectius proposats són genèrics per als codificadors, per capturar millor els disposicions i estructures de taules de taules, FORTAP està construït sobre TUTA, el primer mètode basat en transformadors per a pré-treinar taules de taules de taules amb atenció a arbres. FORTAP supera els mètodes més avançats amb grans marxes en tres conjunts representatius de dades de predicció de fórmules, resposta a preguntes i classificació del tipus de cèl·lula, mostrant el gran potencial d'aprofitar fórmules per a la pré-formació de taula.", 'fi': 'Taulukot tallentavat runsaasti numeerista tietoa, mutta numeerinen päättely taulukoiden yli on edelleen haaste. Tässä artikkelissa toteamme, että laskentataulukon kaava, yleisesti käytetty kieli numeeristen arvojen laskentaan laskentataulukoissa, on arvokas ohjaus numeeriseen päättelyyn taulukoissa. Kun otetaan huomioon suuri määrä verkossa saatavilla olevia laskentataulukoita, ehdotamme FORTAPia, ensimmäistä tutkimusta laskentataulukoiden kaavojen hyödyntämiseksi taulukon esikoulutuksessa. Kaavoista johdetaan kaksi uutta itsevalvottua esikoulutuksen tavoitetta, numeerinen viiteennuste (NRP) ja numeerinen laskentaennuste (NCP). Vaikka ehdotetut tavoitteet ovat yleisiä koodereille, FORTAP on rakennettu TUTA:n varaan, joka on ensimmäinen muuntajapohjainen menetelmä laskentataulukon esikoulutukseen puun huomiolla. FORTAP suoriutuu huippuluokan menetelmistä suurilla marginaaleilla kolmella edustavalla kaavan ennustamisen, kysymysten vastaamisen ja solutyyppiluokittelun tietojoukolla, mikä osoittaa kaavojen hyödyntämisen taulukon esikoulutukseen.', 'et': 'Tabelid salvestavad rikkalikke numbrilisi andmeid, kuid numbriline arutlemine tabelite üle on endiselt väljakutse. Selles töös leiame, et arvutustabeli valem, tavaliselt kasutatav keel arvutuste tegemiseks arvutustabelites, on väärtuslik järelevalve numbrilise arutluse jaoks tabelites. Arvestades suurt hulka veebis saadaolevaid arvutustabeleid, pakume välja FORTAP-i, mis on esimene uuring tabeli eeltreeningu jaoks tabelivalemite kasutamiseks. Valemitest, numbrilisest viiteprognoosist (NRP) ja numbrilisest arvutusprognoosist (NCP) tuletatakse kaks uut enesejärelevalve eelõppe eesmärki. Kuigi meie kavandatud eesmärgid on kodeerijate jaoks üldised, siis arvutustabelite paigutuste ja struktuuride paremaks jäädvustamiseks on FORTAP ehitatud TUTA-le, mis on esimene trafopõhine meetod arvutustabelite eeltreeninguks puu tähelepanuga. FORTAP ületab tipptasemel meetodeid suurte marginaalide poolest kolme representatiivse andmekogumi valemite prognoosimine, küsimustele vastamine ja lahtritüübi klassifitseerimine, näidates tabeli eeltreeningu valemite suurt potentsiaali.', 'jv': 'tab Awak dhéwé luwih akeh, nggawe Punika tentang kanggo Kemerdekaan, populer tentang kanggo tutawak karo kalem barang nèng liyane Tenggo tanggal akeh akeh liyane pernik, sing paling web, kéné nggunakake Format ; Awak dhuwur kaendahing sami-super-prehend pulirgeng punika dipun gulangutan Format, dapat punika (NRP) lan usual tarjamahan (NPP). Nombo awak dhéwé supomongé aksi generic kanggo koder, kanggo langgar sampeyan papan tentang karo structural, FUTA supoyo nggawe TiUTA, perusahaan transformer-basa sing sumulakno kanggo Kemerdekaan tapisan cara-cara sing apik gedung. For', 'he': 'Tables store rich numerical data, but numerical reasoning over tables is still a challenge.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מוצאים שהנוסחת הלוח, שפה משתמשת בדרך כלל כדי לבצע חישובים על ערכים מספריים בלוח, היא פיקוח ערך עבור הגיון מספרי בשולחנות. בהתחשב בכמות גדולות של דפסים זמינים באינטרנט, אנו מציעים FORTAP, החקירה הראשונה כדי להשתמש בנוסחות דפסים לשולחן מחדש. שני מטרות חדשות של שימוש מוקדם בעצמו מושלמים מתוך נוסאות, חיזוי רמז מספרי (NRP) ו חיזוי מספרי (NCP). בעוד המטרות המוצעות שלנו הן גנריות לקודים, כדי לתפוס טוב יותר פיצועי שולחן טבלות ומבנים, FORTAP נבנה על TUTA, השיטה הראשונה המבוססת על המעבר לשולחן טבלות מתאמן מראש עם תשומת לב עץ. FORTAP מציג שיטות מוקדמות על ידי גבולות גדולים על שלושה קבוצות נתונים מייצגיות של צפוי הנוסחא, עניין לשאלות, וסוג תאים מסוים, מראה את הפוטנציאל הגדול של השימוש הנוסחאות לשולחן מראש.', 'ha': "Tables store rich numerical data, but numerical reasoning over tables is still a challenge.  Daga wannan takardan, za mu gane cewa, formula ɗin ajiya wanda aka yi amfani da shi ana cika ƙidãyar masu ƙidãya a cikin kima masu cikin takardan faɗa ɗawa, yana da kima mai kima wa kwanan masu ƙidãya a cikin abun. Aka tunãni da yawan launufi mai amfani da akwatin bayani masu iya samun ta kan web, muna buƙata FURTAP, kuma ana buƙata farkon fitina zuwa formulan akwatin sharuɗe wa tabar da za'a yi mazaɗawa. An samar da abubuwa biyu na noveli wanda aka tsare kansa da bakin ƙayyade (NCP) daga formulan, na gabanin ɗabi'a-digit (NRP) da abu na ƙayyade lissafi (NCP). A lokacin da Muke amfani da jigonmu masu kwamfyuta, ko kuma don ka sami tsarin layayenai na gefen, an gina FARTAP a kan TUTA, hanyon na farkon shifotto da aka canza zane-zane-zane wa zane-zane-zane ya yi fassara da nau'in itãce. FARTAP yana tafiyar shirin-state-of-the-art by huge margins a kan matsayin bayanin fassarar-formula uku, na tambayi, da kuma mai classified nau'i cikin jerin, yana nuna muhimmin mai girma ga wakin formulas wa tabalin tabalin.", 'sk': 'Tabele shranjujejo bogate numerične podatke, vendar je numerično razmišljanje nad tabelami še vedno izziv. V tem prispevku smo ugotovili, da je formula preglednic, pogosto uporabljen jezik za izračun številčnih vrednosti v preglednicah, dragocen nadzor za numerično razmišljanje v tabelah. Glede na velike količine preglednic, ki so na voljo na spletu, predlagamo FORTAP, prvo raziskovanje izkoriščanja formul preglednic za predusposabljanje tabel. Iz formul, numeričnega referenčnega napovedovanja (NRP) in numeričnega izračuna (NCP), sta izpeljana dva nova cilja samonadzorovanega predusposabljanja. Čeprav so naši predlagani cilji generični za kodirnike, za boljše zajemanje postavitev in struktur preglednic tabel, FORTAP temelji na TUTA, prvi transformatorski metodi za predtrening preglednic tabel s pozornostjo drevesa. FORTAP presega najsodobnejše metode z velikimi robovi na treh reprezentativnih naborih podatkov napovedovanja formul, odgovarjanja na vprašanja in klasifikacije vrst celic, kar kaže velik potencial izkoriščanja formul za predusposabljanje tabel.', 'bo': 'Tables store rich numerical data, but numerical reasoning over tables is still a challenge. འོན་ཀྱང་། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྩིས་ཐོག་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་ཚགས་དག་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག We consider large amounts of spreadsheets available on the web, we propose FORTAP, the first exploration to leverage spreadsheet formulas for table pretraining. Two novel self-supervised pretraining objectives are derived from formulas, numerical reference prediction (NRP) and numerical calculation prediction (NCP). While our proposed objectives are generic for encoders, to better capture spreadsheet table layouts and structures, FORTAP is built on TUTA, the first transformer-based method for spreadsheet table pretraining with tree attention. FORTAP outperforms state-of-the-art methods by large margins on three representative datasets of formula prediction, question answering, and cell type classification, showing the great potential of leveraging formulas for table pretraining.'}
{'en': 'Dynamic Prefix-Tuning for Generative Template-based Event Extraction', 'ar': 'الاندماج متعدد الوسائط عبر خسائر مستوحاة من الشبكة القشرية', 'es': 'La fusión multimodal a través de la red cortical inspiró pérdidas', 'pt': 'Fusão multimodal via perdas inspiradas na rede cortical', 'fr': 'Fusion multimodale via des pertes inspirées du réseau cortical', 'ja': '皮質ネットワークを介したマルチモーダル融合の刺激による損失', 'zh': '因皮质网络者多模态融合引损', 'hi': 'कॉर्टिकल नेटवर्क के माध्यम से मल्टीमॉडल संलयन ने नुकसान को प्रेरित किया', 'ru': 'Мультимодальное слияние через потери, вызванные кортикальной сетью', 'ga': 'Comhleá ilmhódach trí líonra cortical caillteanais spreag', 'el': 'Πολυmodale σύντηξη μέσω φλοιώδους δικτύου εμπνευσμένες απώλειες', 'hu': 'Multimodális fúzió a kortikális hálózaton keresztül okozott veszteségek', 'it': 'La fusione multimodale tramite rete corticale ha causato perdite', 'lt': 'Daugiatransporto sintezė per kortikalinius tinklus paskatino nuostolius', 'kk': 'Кортикалық желі арқылы көп модельді жинақтау', 'mk': 'Мултимодилна фузија преку кортичка мрежа инспирираше загуби', 'ms': 'Multimodal fusion via cortical network inspired losses', 'ml': 'കോര്\u200dട്ടിക്കല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും മൂല്യൂട്ടം ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Fużjoni multimodali permezz ta’ netwerk kortikali, telf ispirat', 'mn': 'Кортикийн сүлжээгээр олон модул холбогдол нь', 'pl': 'Multimodalna fuzja poprzez sieć korową spowodowała straty', 'ka': 'მულტიმედიალური ფუზიცია კორტიკალური ქსელის გამოყენებით', 'ro': 'Fuziunea multimodală prin reţeaua corticală a inspirat pierderi', 'no': 'Multimodal fusjon gjennom kortikelnettverk inspirerte tap', 'sr': 'Multimodalna fuzija kroz kortikalnu mrežu inspirisane gubitke', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Safaarad badan oo ku jira shabakadda caadiga ah', 'sv': 'Multimodal fusion via kortikalt nätverk inspirerade förluster', 'ta': 'செங்குத்து வலைப்பின்னல் மூலம் பல மாறுபாடு குறிப்புகள்', 'ur': 'کرٹیکل نیٹ ورک کے ذریعے بہت سی موڈال فوزین ہلاکتوں کے ذریعے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền nhân cách thông qua mạng thượng', 'nl': 'Multimodale fusie via cortical netwerk geïnspireerde verliezen', 'bg': 'Мултимодален синтез чрез кортикална мрежа предизвика загуби', 'hr': 'Multimodalna fuzija kroz kortikalnu mrežu inspirirala gubitke', 'da': 'Multimodal fusion via kortikalt netværk inspirerede tab', 'de': 'Multimodale Fusion über kortikales Netzwerk inspirierte Verluste', 'ko': '피층 네트워크를 통한 다중 모드 융합', 'id': 'Fusi multimodal melalui jaringan kortikal menginspirasi kehilangan', 'fa': 'فشار چندmodal via cortical network inspired losses', 'sw': 'Uhambulizi mkubwa kupitia mitandao ya msingi uliohamasisha hasara', 'tr': 'Kortikel ağ tarapyndan köp modal birleşmesi', 'af': 'Multimodale fuisie deur kortike netwerk inspireerde verlies', 'sq': 'Fuzioni multimodal nëpërmjet rrjetit kortikal frymëzoi humbje', 'am': 'በኮርክቲካል መረብ የተሰጠ ብዛት ጉዳይ', 'hy': 'Մոլորմոդալ ֆուզիան գլխուղեղի ցանցի միջոցով ոգեշնչեց կորուստներ,', 'az': 'Kortikal ańü vasit…ôsil…ô √ßoxlu modal f…ôsasiya t…ôŇükil edildi.', 'bn': 'কোর্টিকেল নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে মাল্টিমোডাল ফ্লিশন ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত', 'bs': 'Multimodalna fuzija kroz kortikalnu mrežu inspirirala gubitke', 'ca': 'La fusió multimodal a través de la xarxa còrtica va inspirar pèrdues', 'cs': 'Multimodální fúze prostřednictvím kortikální sítě inspirované ztráty', 'et': 'Multimodaalne fusioon läbi koorivõrgu tekitas kaotusi', 'fi': 'Multimodaalinen fuusio aivokuoren kautta aiheutti menetyksiä', 'he': 'Multimodal fusion via cortical network inspired losses', 'jv': 'Multimodal floraning', 'sk': 'Multimodalna fuzija prek kortikalnega omrežja, ki je povzročila izgube', 'ha': 'Yi amfani da shirin motsi masu yawa', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་དང་མཐོ་རྩིས་དྲ་བ་ནས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ'}
{'en': 'We consider event extraction in a generative manner with template-based conditional generation.Although there is a rising trend of casting the task of event extraction as a sequence generation problem with prompts, these generation-based methods have two significant challenges, including using suboptimal prompts and static event type information.In this paper, we propose a generative template-based event extraction method with dynamic prefix (GTEE-DynPref) by integrating context information with type-specific prefixes to learn a context-specific prefix for each context.Experimental results show that our model achieves competitive results with the state-of-the-art classification-based model OneIE on ACE 2005 and achieves the best performances on ERE.Additionally, our model is proven to be portable to new types of events effectively.', 'ar': 'يعد تكامل المعلومات من طرائق مختلفة مجالًا نشطًا للبحث. البشر ، وبشكل عام ، الأنظمة العصبية البيولوجية بارعون تمامًا في استخدام العديد من الإشارات من مختلف المجالات الإدراكية الحسية للتفاعل مع البيئة ومع بعضها البعض. أدى العمل الأخير في نماذج الاندماج العميق عبر الشبكات العصبية إلى تحسينات كبيرة على الأساليب أحادية الوسائط في مجالات مثل التعرف على الكلام والتعرف على المشاعر وتحليلها والتسميات التوضيحية ووصف الصورة. ومع ذلك ، فقد ركز هذا البحث في الغالب على التغييرات المعمارية التي تسمح بدمج الطرائق المختلفة مع الحفاظ على تعقيد النموذج قابلاً للإدارة.\nمستوحاة من أفكار علم الأعصاب حول التكامل والمعالجة متعددة الحواس ، نحقق في تأثير إدخال التبعيات العصبية في وظائف الخسارة. تُظهر التجارب على مهام تحليل المشاعر متعددة الوسائط باستخدام نماذج مختلفة أن نهجنا يوفر تعزيزًا ثابتًا للأداء.', 'pt': 'A integração de informações de diferentes modalidades é uma área ativa de pesquisa. Os seres humanos e, em geral, os sistemas neurais biológicos são bastante hábeis em usar uma infinidade de sinais de diferentes campos perceptivos sensoriais para interagir com o ambiente e entre si. Trabalhos recentes em modelos de fusão profunda por meio de redes neurais levaram a melhorias substanciais em abordagens unimodais em áreas como reconhecimento de fala, reconhecimento e análise de emoções, legendagem e descrição de imagens. No entanto, essa pesquisa se concentrou principalmente em mudanças arquitetônicas que permitem a fusão de diferentes modalidades, mantendo a complexidade do modelo gerenciável.\nInspirados em ideias neurocientíficas sobre integração e processamento multissensorial, investigamos o efeito da introdução de dependências neurais nas funções de perda. Experimentos em tarefas de análise de sentimento multimodal com diferentes modelos mostram que nossa abordagem fornece um aumento consistente de desempenho.', 'fr': "L'intégration d'informations provenant de différentes modalités est un domaine de recherche actif. Les êtres humains et, en général, les systèmes neuronaux biologiques sont très habiles à utiliser une multitude de signaux provenant de différents champs de perception sensorielle pour interagir avec l'environnement et les uns avec les autres. Des travaux récents sur des modèles de fusion profonde via des réseaux neuronaux ont permis d'améliorer considérablement les approches unimodales dans des domaines tels que la reconnaissance vocale, la reconnaissance et l'analyse des émotions, le sous-titrage et la description d'images. Cependant, ces recherches se sont principalement concentrées sur les modifications architecturales permettant la fusion de différentes modalités tout en gardant la complexité du modèle gérable.\nInspirés par des idées neuroscientifiques sur l'intégration et le traitement multisensoriels, nous étudions l'effet de l'introduction de dépendances neuronales dans les fonctions de perte. Des expériences sur des tâches d'analyse des sentiments multimodales avec différents modèles montrent que notre approche fournit une amélioration constante des performances.", 'es': 'La integración de la información de diferentes modalidades es un área activa de investigación. Los seres humanos y, en general, los sistemas neuronales biológicos son muy expertos en utilizar una multitud de señales de diferentes campos perceptivos sensoriales para interactuar con el entorno y entre sí. El trabajo reciente en modelos de fusión profunda a través de redes neuronales ha llevado a mejoras sustanciales con respecto a los enfoques unimodales en áreas como el reconocimiento de voz, el reconocimiento y análisis de emociones, los subtítulos y la descripción de imágenes. Sin embargo, dicha investigación se ha centrado principalmente en cambios arquitectónicos que permiten la fusión de diferentes modalidades y, al mismo tiempo, mantienen la complejidad del modelo manejable.\nInspirados en ideas neurocientíficas sobre la integración y el procesamiento multisensorial, investigamos el efecto de introducir dependencias neuronales en las funciones de pérdida. Los experimentos en tareas de análisis de sentimientos multimodales con diferentes modelos muestran que nuestro enfoque proporciona un aumento constante del rendimiento.', 'ja': '異なる様式からの情報統合は、研究の活発な分野である。 人間、そして一般的には生物学的な神経系は、さまざまな知覚野からの多数のシグナルを使用して環境と相互作用することに非常に適しています。 ニューラルネットワークを介した深層融合モデルの最近の研究は、音声認識、感情認識および分析、キャプション作成、および画像記述などの分野における単式アプローチよりも大幅な改善をもたらしました。 しかし、このような研究は、モデルの複雑さを管理可能なままにしながら、異なるモダリティの融合を可能にする建築的変化に主に焦点を当てている。\n多感覚統合と処理に関する神経科学的アイデアに触発され、損失関数に神経依存性を導入することの効果を調査します。 さまざまなモデルを用いたマルチモーダルセンチメント分析タスクの実験は、当社のアプローチが一貫したパフォーマンスの向上を提供することを示しています。', 'zh': '异式之信整合一跃之域也。 凡人类,生物神经系统善用感知之号,与境相用。 近者神经网络深融模形,情识析析,字幕象单峰法实质性改。 然要在架构改,许融合之模态,兼守模复杂性之可管理性。\n多感官整合神经科学意,研函数入神经依赖性功。 情析职实验,同性而升。', 'hi': 'विभिन्न तौर-तरीकों से सूचना एकीकरण अनुसंधान का एक सक्रिय क्षेत्र है। मनुष्य और, सामान्य तौर पर, जैविक तंत्रिका प्रणालियां पर्यावरण और एक दूसरे के साथ बातचीत करने के लिए विभिन्न संवेदी बोधगम्य क्षेत्रों से संकेतों की एक भीड़ का उपयोग करने में काफी माहिर हैं। तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के माध्यम से गहरे संलयन मॉडल में हाल के काम ने भाषण मान्यता, भावना पहचान और विश्लेषण, कैप्शनिंग और छवि विवरण जैसे क्षेत्रों में यूनिमोडल दृष्टिकोण पर पर्याप्त सुधार किया है। हालांकि, इस तरह के शोध ने ज्यादातर आर्किटेक्चरल परिवर्तनों पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है जो मॉडल जटिलता को प्रबंधनीय रखते हुए विभिन्न तरीकों के संलयन की अनुमति देता है।\nबहुसंवेदी एकीकरण और प्रसंस्करण के बारे में न्यूरोसाइंटिफिक विचारों से प्रेरित होकर, हम नुकसान कार्यों में तंत्रिका निर्भरताओं को पेश करने के प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं। विभिन्न मॉडलों के साथ बहुआयामी भावना विश्लेषण कार्यों पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण एक सुसंगत प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देता है।', 'ru': 'Интеграция информации из различных источников является активной областью исследований. Люди и, в целом, биологические нейронные системы достаточно хорошо умеют использовать множество сигналов из различных сенсорных полей восприятия для взаимодействия с окружающей средой и друг с другом. Недавняя работа в моделях глубокого слияния через нейронные сети привела к существенным улучшениям по сравнению с унимодальными подходами в таких областях, как распознавание речи, распознавание и анализ эмоций, субтитры и описание изображений. Однако такие исследования в основном были сосредоточены на архитектурных изменениях, позволяющих слияние различных методов при сохранении управляемой сложности модели.\nВдохновленные нейронаучными идеями о мультисенсорной интеграции и обработке, мы исследуем эффект введения нейронных зависимостей в функции потерь. Эксперименты над задачами мультимодального анализа настроений с разными моделями показывают, что наш подход обеспечивает последовательное повышение производительности.', 'ga': 'Is réimse gníomhach taighde é comhtháthú faisnéise ó mhódúlachtaí éagsúla. Tá daoine agus, go ginearálta, córais bhitheolaíocha néaracha sách cumasach maidir le húsáid a bhaint as an iliomad comharthaí ó réimsí braite céadfacha éagsúla chun idirghníomhú leis an gcomhshaol agus lena chéile. De bharr obair a rinneadh le déanaí ar shamhlacha comhleá domhain trí líonraí néaracha tá feabhsuithe suntasacha ar chur chuige aonmhódúil i réimsí mar aithint cainte, aithint agus anailís mothúcháin, fotheidealú agus cur síos ar íomhánna. Mar sin féin, dhírigh taighde den sórt sin go príomha ar athruithe ailtireachta a cheadaíonn comhtháthú na módúlachta éagsúla agus ag an am céanna castacht na samhla a choinneáil inbhainistithe.\nArna spreagadh ag smaointe néareolaíoch maidir le comhtháthú agus próiseáil ilchéadfach, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an éifeacht a bhaineann le spleáchais néaracha a thabhairt isteach sna feidhmeanna caillteanais. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thascanna ilmhódacha anailíse meon le samhlacha éagsúla go soláthraíonn ár gcur chuige treisiú comhsheasmhach feidhmíochta.', 'el': 'Η ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών από διαφορετικές μεθόδους είναι ένας ενεργός τομέας έρευνας. Τα ανθρώπινα όντα και γενικά τα βιολογικά νευρωνικά συστήματα είναι αρκετά επιδέξια στη χρήση πολλών σημάτων από διαφορετικά αισθητηριακά αντιληπτικά πεδία για να αλληλεπιδρούν με το περιβάλλον και το ένα με το άλλο. Πρόσφατες εργασίες σε μοντέλα βαθιάς σύντηξης μέσω νευρωνικών δικτύων έχουν οδηγήσει σε ουσιαστικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τις μονοmodale προσεγγίσεις σε τομείς όπως η αναγνώριση ομιλίας, η αναγνώριση και ανάλυση συναισθημάτων, οι λεζάντες και η περιγραφή εικόνας εικόνας. Ωστόσο, η έρευνα αυτή έχει ως επί το πλείστον επικεντρωθεί σε αρχιτεκτονικές αλλαγές που επιτρέπουν τη συγχώνευση διαφορετικών μορφών διατηρώντας παράλληλα την πολυπλοκότητα του μοντέλου διαχειρίσιμη.', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის ინტერგურაცია განსხვავებული მოდილისგან არის სწავლობას აქტიური ადგილი. ადამიანები და, საერთოდ, ბოლოგიური ნეიროლური სისტემები მსგავსი სიგნალის გამოყენებაში განსხვავებული სიგნალიდან განსხვავებული სიგნალიდან გამოყენება განსხვავებული სიგნალიდან და ერთმა მიმდინარე სამუშაო ფუზიციის მოდელში ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენებაში მნიშვნელოვანი უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტი მაგრამ ასეთი შესწავლობა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია არქიტექტურული ცვლილებზე, რომლებიც განსხვავებული მოდიალებების ფუნქციაში შეუძლებელია მოდელური კომპლექტიურ', 'it': "L'integrazione delle informazioni da modalità diverse è un settore attivo di ricerca. Gli esseri umani e, in generale, i sistemi neurali biologici sono abbastanza abili nell'utilizzare una moltitudine di segnali provenienti da diversi campi percettivi sensoriali per interagire con l'ambiente e l'uno con l'altro. Il recente lavoro sui modelli di fusione profonda tramite reti neurali ha portato a miglioramenti sostanziali rispetto agli approcci unimodali in aree come il riconoscimento vocale, il riconoscimento e l'analisi delle emozioni, la didascalia e la descrizione delle immagini. Tuttavia, tale ricerca si è concentrata principalmente sui cambiamenti architettonici che consentono la fusione di diverse modalità mantenendo la complessità del modello gestibile.", 'kk': 'Түрлі әдістерден мәліметтің интеграциясы - зерттеу белсенді аумағы. Адам және жалпы, биологиялық невраллық жүйелер әртүрлі сезімді өрістерден көптеген сигналарды қолдану үшін әртүрлі орта және бір-бірімен байланыс етеді. Невралды желілер арқылы жаңа жұмыс істеу үлгілерінде, сөздерді анықтау, емоцияларды анықтау, анализ, айдары мен кескіндің сипаттамасы сипаттамасы секілді бірнеше жағдайда жақсы жақсы көптеген. Бірақ бұл зерттеулердің көпшілігі архитектуралық өзгерістеріне көмектеседі, үлгісін басқаруға мүмкіндік беруге мүмкіндік береді.', 'hu': 'A különböző módszerekből származó információintegráció aktív kutatási terület. Az emberi lények és általában a biológiai idegrendszerek nagyon jól tudják használni a különböző érzékelő területek jeleinek sokaságát, hogy interakcióba lépjenek a környezettel és egymással. A neurális hálózatokon keresztül végzett mélyfúziós modellek közelmúltbeli munkája jelentős javulást eredményezett az unimodális megközelítésekkel szemben olyan területeken, mint a beszédfelismerés, az érzelmek felismerése és elemzése, a feliratozás és a képelírás. Az ilyen kutatások azonban leginkább az építészeti változásokra összpontosítottak, amelyek lehetővé teszik a különböző módszerek fúzióját, miközben kezelhetővé teszik a modell komplexitását.', 'ms': 'Integrasi maklumat dari modaliti yang berbeza adalah kawasan penyelidikan aktif. Human beings and, in general, biological neural systems are quite adept at using a multitude of signals from different sensory perceptive fields to interact with the environment and each other.  Kerja baru-baru ini dalam model fusi dalam melalui rangkaian saraf telah membawa kepada peningkatan yang besar atas pendekatan unimodal dalam kawasan seperti pengenalisan ucapan, pengenalisan emosi dan analisis, pengenalisan dan gambar. Bagaimanapun, kajian tersebut terutama fokus pada perubahan arkitektur yang membenarkan fusi dari modaliti yang berbeza sambil menjaga kompleksiti model boleh dikendalikan.', 'mk': 'Информациската интеграција од различни модели е активна област на истражување. Човечките суштества и, генерално, биолошките нервни системи се прилично пристојни во користењето на многуте сигнали од различни сензориски перцептивни пола за интеракција со животната средина и меѓусебно. Неодамнешната работа во моделите на длабока фузија преку невровните мрежи доведе до значителни подобрувања во однос на унимодалните пристапи во области како што се препознавањето на говорот, препознавањето и анализа на емоциите, насловот и описот на сликата. Сепак, ваквите истражувања се фокусираа претежно на архитектурните промени кои овозможуваат фузија на различни модели, при што моделот е комплексен за управување.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്നത് പഠനത്തിന്റെ സജ്ജീവമാണ്. മനുഷ്യരും, പൊതുവായി, ബൈയോളജിക്കല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത സെന്ററിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരുപാട് സിഗ്നലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കു സംസാരം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച്, വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചും വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെയും വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെയും പ്രദ എങ്കിലും ഇതുപോലുള്ള പഠനത്തില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. മോഡലിന്റെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ സംവിധാനങ്ങള', 'mt': 'Information integration from different modalities is an active area of research.  Il-bnedmin u, b’mod ġenerali, is-sistemi newrali bijoloġiċi huma pjuttost adattati fl-użu ta’ għadd kbir ta’ sinjali minn oqsma sensittivi differenti biex jinteraġixxu mal-ambjent u ma’ xulxin. Xogħol reċenti f’mudelli ta’ fużjoni profonda permezz ta’ netwerks newrali wassal għal titjib sostanzjali fuq approċċi unimodali f’oqsma bħar-rikonoxximent tad-diskors, ir-rikonoxximent u l-analiżi tal-emozzjonijiet, il-captioning u d-deskrizzjoni tal-immaġni. Madankollu, riċerka bħal din iffokat l-aktar fuq bidliet arkitettoniċi li jippermettu l-fużjoni ta’ modalitajiet differenti filwaqt li żammet il-kumplessità tal-mudell maniġerjabbli.', 'mn': 'Өөр төрлийн арга замын мэдээллийн нэгтгэл нь судалгааны актив хэсэг юм. Хүн төрөлхтөн, ерөнхийдөө биологийн мэдрэмжтэй салбараас олон сигнал ашиглан орчин тойрноос харилцаж байх боломжтой байдаг. Сүүлийн үед мэдрэлийн сүлжээгээр гүн гүнзгий нэгтгэл загварын ажиллагаанд илтгэл таних, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн таних, шинжилгээ, сэтгэл хөдлөл болон зураг тайлбарлах мэт газрын нэгэн арга зам дээр маш их сайжру Гэвч ийм судалгаа ихэнхдээ архитектур өөрчлөлтийг төвлөрүүлж, загварын цогцыг удирдах боломжтой болгодог архитектур өөрчлөлтийг төвлөрүүлсэн.', 'pl': 'Integracja informacji z różnych sposobów jest aktywnym obszarem badań. Ludzie i ogólnie biologiczne układy neuronowe są dość umiejętni w wykorzystywaniu wielu sygnałów z różnych pól percepcyjnych zmysłów do interakcji ze środowiskiem i ze sobą nawzajem. Ostatnie prace nad modelami głębokiej fuzji za pośrednictwem sieci neuronowych doprowadziły do znaczącej poprawy w stosunku do unimodalnych podejść w obszarach takich jak rozpoznawanie mowy, rozpoznawanie i analiza emocji, napisy i opis obrazu. Jednak badania takie skupiają się głównie na zmianach architektonicznych pozwalających na połączenie różnych modalności przy jednoczesnym utrzymaniu złożoności modelu w możliwości zarządzania.', 'no': 'Informasjonsintegrering frå ulike modusar er eit aktiv forskningsområde. Menneske, og generelt biologiske neuralsystemer er ganske passande ved å bruka mange signaler frå ulike sensoreoppfattige felter for å samarbeide med miljøet og kvarandre. Nyleg har arbeidet i dype fuseringsmodeller gjennom neuralnettverk ført til store forbedringar over unimodale tilnærmingar i områda som tale gjenkjenning, følelseskjenning og analyse, tittel og biletskriving. Desse forskningar har imidlertid hovudsakelig fokusert på arkitekturale endringar som tillater å fyssera forskjellige modular mens modellen er kompleksiteten handsamarbar.', 'lt': 'Information integration from different modalities is an active area of research.  Žmonės ir apskritai biologinės nervų sistemos yra pakankamai tinkamos naudoti daugybę signalų iš skirtingų jutimo suvokimo laukų sąveikai su aplinka ir viena kita. Neseniai atliktas giliosios branduolių sintezės modelių kūrimas per nervinius tinklus padėjo gerokai pagerinti vienodo pobūdžio metodus tokiose srityse kaip kalbos pripažinimas, emocijų pripažinimas ir analizė, įrašas ir vaizdo aprašymas. Vis dėlto tokie tyrimai daugiausia buvo skirti architektūriniams pokyčiams, leidžiantiems įvairių rūšių branduolinę sintezę, tuo pačiu išlaikant galimybę valdyti modelio sudėtingumą.', 'ro': 'Integrarea informațiilor din diferite modalități este un domeniu activ de cercetare. Ființele umane și, în general, sistemele neuronale biologice sunt destul de adecvate în utilizarea unei multitudini de semnale din diferite câmpuri perceptive senzoriale pentru a interacționa cu mediul și reciproc. Lucrările recente în modele de fuziune profundă prin intermediul rețelelor neuronale au dus la îmbunătățiri substanțiale față de abordările unimodale în domenii precum recunoașterea vorbirii, recunoașterea și analiza emoțiilor, subtitrarea și descrierea imaginii. Cu toate acestea, astfel de cercetări s-au concentrat în principal pe schimbările arhitecturale care permit fuziunea diferitelor modalități, menținând în același timp complexitatea modelului gestionabilă.', 'sr': 'Integracija informacija iz različitih moda je aktivna oblast istraživanja. Ljudska bića i, općenito, biološki neuralni sistemi su prilično odgovarajući upotrebi mnogih signala iz različitih senzornih perceptivnih polja da se mijenjaju sa okolišću i sa drugim. Nedavno rad u dubokim modelima fuzije kroz neuralne mreže doveo je do značajnog poboljšanja u neomodalnim pristupima u područjima poput priznanja govora, priznanja emocija i analize, kapisanja i opisa slika. Međutim, takvo istraživanje se uglavnom fokusiralo na arhitekturne promjene koje omogućavaju kombinaciju različitih modaliteta dok je modela kompleksnost upravljala.', 'si': 'වෙනස් විධානයෙන් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණයේ සක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරදේශයක්. මිනිස්සුන් සහ, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, ජීවිත න්\u200dයූරල් පද්ධතිය සංඥාවක් වෙනස් සංඥාවක් භාවිත කරනවා වර්තනය සහ එක්කෙනෙ අලුත් වැඩේ ගොඩක් සම්පූර්ණ මොඩේල් එක්ක න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයෙන් විධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නිමෝඩියාල් අවස්ථාවක් වගේ අවස්ථාව නමුත්, අනිවාර්ය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් විදියට පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස්', 'so': 'La-qabsashada macluumaadka noocyada kala duduwan waa dal shaqeeya oo waxbarasho ah. Dadka iyo sida caadiga ah nidaamka dabeecada ee naxaadka waxaa ku filan in ay isticmaalaan calaamado faro badan oo ka yimaadaan beeraha aragtida kala duduwan si ay isula xiriiraan deegaanka iyo qaarba midka kale. Shaqoda ugu dambeysay sameynta fudud oo mool dheer ah oo lagu isticmaalay shabakadaha neurada waxaa laga helay hagaajiyo aad u weyn oo ka sii kordhisan qaababka noocyada ah, sida aqoonsashada hadalka, aqoonsashada iyo baaritaanka, sawirka iyo sawirka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashadaas waxaa ugu badan ku kalsoonaaday isbedelka dhismaha, taasoo u heli kara qalabka kala duwan marka uu sameynayo qaababka adag.', 'sv': 'Informationsintegration från olika metoder är ett aktivt forskningsområde. Människor och i allmänhet biologiska neurala system är ganska skickliga på att använda en mängd signaler från olika sensoriska perceptionsfält för att interagera med miljön och varandra. Det senaste arbetet med djupfusionsmodeller via neurala nätverk har lett till betydande förbättringar jämfört med unimodala tillvägagångssätt inom områden som taligenkänning, känsloigenkänning och analys, bildtext och bildbeskrivning. Men sådan forskning har främst fokuserat på arkitektoniska förändringar som möjliggör fusion av olika modaliteter samtidigt som modellkomplexiteten hålls hanterbar.', 'ta': 'வேறு வகைகளிலிருந்து தகவல் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு ஆராய்ச்சியின் செயல் பகுதியாகும். மனிதர்கள் மற்றும், பொதுவாக, உயிரியல் புதிய முறைமைகள் மிகவும் போதுமானது, வேறு உணர்வு புலங்களிலிருந்து பல குறிகளை பயன்படுத்தி சூழல் மற புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மூலம் அண்மையான குளிர்ச்சி மாதிரிகளில் சமீபத்திய வேலை செய்யும் பேச்சு அடையாளம், உணர்வு அறிவு மற்றும் ஆராய்வு, பிம் ஆனால், இது போன்ற ஆராய்ச்சி பெரும்பாலாகவே கட்டுரைய மாற்றங்களை கவனம் செலுத்தியுள்ளது மாதிரியின் சிக்கல் நிர்வாக மு', 'ur': 'مختلف موڈلیٹوں سے معلومات تفریق کا ایک فعال منطقه ہے۔ انسان اور، عمومی طور پر، بیولوژیکی نیورال سیستموں کو مختلف سیگنالوں سے بہت سیگنالیں استعمال کرنے کے لئے بہت اچھے ہیں جن کے متعلق محیط اور ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ تعامل کرنے کے لئے۔ نیورل نیٹورک کے ذریعے اگلے عمیق فسین موڈلز میں اپنا کام نیورل نیٹورک کے ذریعے ایسے منطقے میں بہت سی سیدھی بات پہچانیں، احساسات پہچانیں اور تحلیل، کپٹیونٹ اور تصویر کی توصیف کے ذریعے بہت However, such research has mostly focused on architectural changes allowing for fusion of different modalities while keeping the model complexity manageable.', 'uz': "@ info Umumiy insonlar va umumiy, biological neyrologi tizimlari juda yetarli bo'lgan, har xil sensorli holatdan bir necha xil signallar yordamida, muhit va birлари bilan birga bog'langan. Name Шундай қилиб, ушбу тармоғи моделнинг компликликни бошқарувчиликни бажаришга қодир бўлган архикторликда ўзгартиришларга муҳтож кўриб чиқади.", 'vi': 'Nhận biết dựa trên phương thức khác nhau là một lĩnh vực nghiên cứu tích cực. Loài người và, nói chung, hệ thần kinh sinh học rất thông thạo sử dụng rất nhiều tín hiệu từ các trường nhận thức khác nhau để tác động với môi trường và nhau. Công việc gần đây của các mô hình nhiệt hạch sâu thông qua mạng thần kinh đã dẫn đến cải tiến đáng kể về các phương pháp đô thị trong lĩnh vực nhận dạng giọng nói, nhận dạng cảm xúc và phân tích, xác định và mô tả ảnh. Tuy nhiên, nghiên cứu này đã chủ yếu tập trung vào những thay đổi kiến trúc cho phép hợp các phương thức khác nhau trong khi giữ tính phức tạp kiểu mẫu dễ quản lý.', 'bg': 'Интегрирането на информацията от различни модали е активна област на научните изследвания. Човешките същества и като цяло биологичните невронни системи са доста умели да използват множество сигнали от различни сетивни възприемчиви полета, за да взаимодействат с околната среда и помежду си. Последната работа в моделите на дълбок синтез чрез невронни мрежи доведе до значителни подобрения в сравнение с унимодалните подходи в области като разпознаване на реч, разпознаване и анализ на емоции, надписи и описание на изображения. Въпреки това, тези изследвания са фокусирани предимно върху архитектурните промени, позволяващи сливане на различни модали, като същевременно запазват сложността на модела управляема.', 'nl': 'Informatie-integratie vanuit verschillende modaliteiten is een actief onderzoeksgebied. De mens en, in het algemeen, biologische neurale systemen zijn behoorlijk bedreven in het gebruik van een veelheid van signalen van verschillende zintuiglijke waarnemingsvelden om te communiceren met de omgeving en met elkaar. Recent werk in deep fusion modellen via neurale netwerken heeft geleid tot aanzienlijke verbeteringen ten opzichte van unimodale benaderingen op gebieden als spraakherkenning, emotie herkenning en analyse, ondertiteling en beeldbeschrijving. Dit onderzoek is echter vooral gericht op architecturale veranderingen waardoor verschillende modaliteiten kunnen worden samengevoegd terwijl de complexiteit van het model beheersbaar blijft.', 'hr': 'Integracija informacija iz različitih načina je aktivna područja istraživanja. Ljudska bića i, općenito, biološki neuronski sustavi su prilično odgovarajući koristiti mnoge signale iz različitih osjetljivih polja za interakciju s okolišću i jedni drugima. Nedavno rad u dubokim modelima fuzije kroz neurone mreže doveo je do značajnog poboljšanja nad unimodalnim pristupima u područjima poput priznanja govora, priznanja emocija i analize, kapicije i opisa slika. Međutim, takvo istraživanje je uglavnom usredotočilo na arhitekturne promjene koje omogućavaju fuziju različitih modaliteta, dok je modela kompleksnost upravljala.', 'da': 'Informationsintegration fra forskellige metoder er et aktivt forskningsområde. Mennesker og generelt biologiske neurale systemer er ganske dygtige til at bruge en lang række signaler fra forskellige sanseopfattelsesfelter til at interagere med miljøet og hinanden. Seneste arbejde med dyb fusionsmodeller via neurale netværk har ført til betydelige forbedringer i forhold til unimodale tilgange inden for områder som talegenkendelse, følelsesgenkendelse og analyse, billedtekster og billedbeskrivelse. Men sådan forskning har hovedsagelig fokuseret på arkitektoniske ændringer, der muliggør fusion af forskellige modaliteter, samtidig med at modelkompleksiteten holdes overskuelig.', 'de': 'Informationsintegration aus verschiedenen Modalitäten ist ein aktives Forschungsgebiet. Menschen und generell biologische Nervensysteme sind sehr geschickt darin, eine Vielzahl von Signalen aus verschiedenen sensorischen Wahrnehmungsfeldern zu nutzen, um mit der Umwelt und untereinander zu interagieren. Jüngste Arbeiten an Deep Fusion Modellen über neuronale Netze haben zu erheblichen Verbesserungen gegenüber unimodalen Ansätzen in Bereichen wie Spracherkennung, Emotionserkennung und -analyse, Untertitelung und Bildbeschreibung geführt. Diese Forschung konzentriert sich jedoch hauptsächlich auf architektonische Veränderungen, die eine Fusion verschiedener Modalitäten ermöglichen und gleichzeitig die Komplexität des Modells beherrschbar halten.', 'id': 'Integrasi informasi dari modalitas yang berbeda adalah daerah penelitian aktif. Manusia dan, secara umum, sistem saraf biologis cukup cocok menggunakan banyak sinyal dari medan persepsi sensor yang berbeda untuk berinteraksi dengan lingkungan dan satu sama lain. Pekerjaan baru-baru ini dalam model fusi dalam melalui jaringan saraf telah menyebabkan peningkatan yang besar atas pendekatan unimodal di daerah seperti pengenalisan pidato, pengenalisan emosi dan analisis, captioning dan gambar deskripsi. Namun, penelitian tersebut telah terutama fokus pada perubahan arsitektur yang memungkinkan fusi dari modalitas yang berbeda sementara menjaga kompleksitas model dapat dikendalikan.', 'fa': 'ترکیب اطلاعات از روش های مختلف یک منطقه تحقیقات فعالی است. انسان ها و، در کل، سیستم\u200cهای عصبی بیولوژیکی کاملاً به استفاده از بسیاری سیگنال\u200cهای متفاوت از زمینه\u200cهای مفهوم حسی برای تعامل با محیط و همدیگر مناسب هستند. کارهای اخیرا در مدل\u200cهای عمیق ترکیب از طریق شبکه\u200cهای عصبی به پیشرفت\u200cهای زیادی بر روی دسترسی\u200cهای غیرmodal در منطقه\u200cهای مانند شناختن سخنرانی، شناختن احساسات و تحلیل، عنوان و توصیف تصویر، به پیشرفت زیادی رسید. با این حال، این تحقیقات بیشتر روی تغییرات معماری تمرکز کرده است که اجازه می دهد که در حالی که مدل پیچیدگی را قابل مدیریت نگه دارد.', 'ko': '서로 다른 모델의 정보 통합은 활발한 연구 분야다.인류와 일반적인 생물신경계는 서로 다른 감각 감지 영역에서 온 대량의 신호를 사용하여 환경과 서로 상호작용을 하는 데 매우 뛰어나다.최근 신경 네트워크를 통해 깊이 있는 융합 모델에 대한 연구를 통해 음성인식, 감정인식과 분석, 자막과 이미지 묘사 등 분야에서 단봉법보다 더 큰 발전을 이루었다.그러나 이런 연구는 주로 구조 변경에 집중되어 서로 다른 모델의 융합을 허용하고 모델의 복잡성을 제어할 수 있도록 한다.', 'sw': 'Ushirikiano wa taarifa kutoka katika njia tofauti ni eneo la utafiti. Binadamu na, kwa ujumla, mfumo wa neurali wa kibaiolojia unatosha sana kwa kutumia ishara nyingi kutoka kwenye maeneo tofauti ya hisia ili kuwasiliana na mazingira na wengine. Kazi za hivi karibuni katika mitandao ya uchimbaji madhubuti kupitia mitandao ya neurali imesababisha maboresho makubwa zaidi ya namna ya upatikanaji wa kipekee katika maeneo kama kutambua hotuba, kutambua hisia na uchambuzi, kuchukua picha na maelezo ya picha. Hata hivyo, utafiti huu umejikita zaidi kwenye mabadiliko ya ujenzi yanayoruhusu kuondolewa kwa namna tofauti wakati huo huo unaweza kusimamia vigumu.', 'tr': 'Farkl캇 modlerden maglumat integrasy ara힊tyrmany흫 aktiw b철legidir. Adamlar we umumy g철r채 biologi첵aly n채us sistemalar farkl캇 du첵gular alanlardan bir s체r체 sinyal ulanmakda birbirlerine 철wr체li힊mek 체챌in 첵eterlik bolup ge챌첵채rler. 횦akynda n채yral 힊ebekeler g철r채 첵체z 챌철k체p bilen birle힊me modellerinde 챌yky힊 tana첵masy, du첵gym tana첵masy we analizi, kell채p we surat waspynda 철r채n gowurak getirdi. 횦철ne 힊e첵le bir ara힊tyrma nusgasyny arhitekturylyk 체첵tgewlerine 체첵tged첵채r, nusgasyny g철rkezm채ge m체mkin ed첵채n d채ldir.', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ ማጠቃለያ ከልዩ ዓይነቶች የተለየ ትምህርት ቦታ ነው፡፡ የሰዎች እና በጠቅላላ፣ የbiological neyrological systems በተለየ ልዩ እውቀት እርሻዎች እና እርስ በርሳቸው ጋር ማግኘት ብዙ ሲልክዎችን በመጠቀም ይበቃሉ፡፡ በጠለቅ ውጤት ሞላቶች ውስጥ በናውሮል መረብ በመጠቀም የቋንቋ ማስታወቂያውን፣ ስብሰባውን ማወቅ እና አስተያየት፣ ማቀናቀል እና የምስል ግለጻ በሚመስል ክፍሎች ላይ የውጤት ክፍተቶችን አቀረበ፡፡ ነገር ግን እንደዚህ ምርመራ ብዙውን የመርከቦች ለውጦችን በተለየ ልዩ ዓይነቶች እንዲያስወግድ በሞዴል አካባቢነትን በመቀናኘት ላይ ያስተካክሎታል፡፡', 'hy': 'Տարբեր միջոցներից տեղեկատվական ինտեգրացիան հետազոտության ակտիվ ոլորտ է: Մարդիկ և, ընդհանուր առմամբ, կենսաբանական նյարդային համակարգերը բավականին հարմար են օգտագործել տարբեր զգայական ընկալելիք դաշտերից բազմաթիվ ազդանշաններ շրջակա միջավայրի և միմյանց հետ փոխազդելու համար: Նյարդային ցանցերի միջոցով հիմնական ֆուզիոնային մոդելների վերջին աշխատանքը հանգեցրեց նշանակալի բարելավումներին միամոդալ մոտեցումների վերաբերյալ այնպիսի ոլորտներում, ինչպիսիք են խոսքի ճանաչման, զգացմունքների ճանաչման և վեր Այնուամենայնիվ, այդպիսի հետազոտությունները հիմնականում կենտրոնացել են ճարտարապետական փոփոխությունների վրա, որոնք հնարավորություն են տալիս տարբեր միջոցների միաձուլումը, մինչդեռ մոդելի բարդությունը կառավարել', 'af': "Informasieintegrasie van verskillende modaliteite is 'n aktiewe area van ondersoek. Mensekind en, in algemeen, biologiese neurale stelsels is heeltemal ooreenkomstig om 'n menigte signale te gebruik van verskillende sensoriese perceptiewe velde te interaksie met die omgewing en mekaar. Onlangste werk in diep fuisie modele deur neurale netwerke het gedoen om beter te maak oor unimodale toegange in areas soos spreek herken, emosie herken en analiseer, titel en beeldbeskrywing. Maar sodanige ondersoek het meeste gefokus op arkitektuurle veranderinge wat toelaat vir verfussie van verskillende modaliteite terwyl die model kompleksiteit bestuurbaar hou.", 'sq': 'Integrimi i informacionit nga modalitete të ndryshme është një fushë aktive kërkimi. Human beings and, in general, biological neural systems are quite adept at using a multitude of signals from different sensory perceptive fields to interact with the environment and each other.  Puna e fundit në modelet e fuzionit të thellë nëpërmjet rrjeteve nervore ka çuar në përmirësime thelbësore lidhur me qasjet unimodale në fusha si njohja e fjalës, njohja dhe analiza e emocioneve, titullimi dhe përshkrimi i imazhit. Megjithatë, kërkimi i tillë është përqëndruar kryesisht në ndryshimet arkitekturale që lejojnë fuzionin e modaliteteve të ndryshme duke mbajtur kompleksitetin e modelit të menaxhueshëm.', 'az': 'Müxtəlif modüllərdən məlumat integrasiyası çalışma bölgesidir. İnsanlar və genel olaraq biyolojik nöral sistemlər müxtəlif hiss sahiblərindən bir çox sinyal istifadə etmək üçün bir çox mövcuddur. Nəyral ağları vasitəsilə ən yaxın fəsasiya modellərində ən yaxın işlər danışma tanıması, emosyon tanıması və analizi, başlıq və surat tanıması kimi çox çox yaxşı işlər yaratdı. Ancaq bu araştırma çox arhitektür dəyişikliklərinə odaqlandı ki, modellərin kompleksitəsini idarə edə biləcəyi vaxt fərqli modülləri birləşdirə bilər.', 'ca': "L'integració de la informació de diferents modalitats és una àrea activa de recerca. Els éssers humans i, en general, els sistemes neurològics biològics són bastant adeptos en utilitzar una gran quantitat de senyals de diferents camps perceptius sensorials per interactuar amb l'entorn i els uns amb els altres. La feina recent en models de fusió profunda a través de xarxes neurals ha portat a millors substancials en enfocaments unimodals en àrees com el reconeixement del discurs, el reconeixement emocional i l'anàlisi, la captura i la descripció de la imatge. However, such research has mostly focused on architectural changes allowing for fusion of different modalities while keeping the model complexity manageable.", 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ধরনের তথ্য সম্পূর্ণ সংযোগ হচ্ছে গবেষণার একটি সক্রিয় এলাকা। মানুষ এবং সাধারণত পরিবেশ এবং একে অপরের সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে বিভিন্ন সেন্সরিয়ার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ক্ষেত্র থেকে অনেক সিগন্যাল ব্যবহার করে বৈ নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে গভীর ফ্যাশন মডেলে সাম্প্রতিক কাজের ফলে ভাষণ স্বীকার, আবেগ স্বীকৃতি এবং বিশ্লেষণ, ক্যাপ্টেশন এবং ছবির বর্ণনা অনু তবে এই গবেষণাগুলো বেশীরভাগ স্থানীয় পরিবর্তনের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে যার ফলে মডেলের জটিলতা ব্যবস্থা রাখার সময় বিভিন্ন ধরনের ফিউশনে', 'bs': 'Integracija informacija iz različitih načina je aktivna područja istraživanja. Ljudska bića i, općenito, biološki neuralni sistemi su prilično odgovarajući upotrebom mnogih signala iz različitih senzornih perceptivnih polja kako bi se interakcija sa okolišću i jedno drugom. Nedavno rad u dubokim modelima fuzije kroz neuralne mreže doveo je do značajnog poboljšanja nad unimodalnim pristupima u područjima poput priznanja govora, priznanja emocija i analize, napisa i opisa slika. Međutim, takvo istraživanje se uglavnom fokusiralo na arhitekturne promjene koje omogućavaju kombinaciju različitih modaliteta dok je modela kompleksnost upravljala.', 'et': 'Teabe integreerimine erinevatest viisidest on aktiivne teadusvaldkond. Inimesed ja üldiselt bioloogilised närvisüsteemid on üsna osavad kasutama paljusid signaale erinevatest sensoorsetest tajuvaldkondadest, et suhelda keskkonna ja üksteisega. Hiljutine töö sügavfusiooni mudelitega neurovõrkude kaudu on toonud kaasa märkimisväärseid parandusi võrreldes unimodaalsete lähenemisviisidega sellistes valdkondades nagu kõnetuvastus, emotsioonide tuvastamine ja analüüs, pealdiste ja piltide kirjeldus. Siiski on sellised uuringud keskendunud peamiselt arhitektuurilistele muutustele, mis võimaldavad erinevate mudelite ühendamist, hoides samas mudeli keerukust hallatavana.', 'fi': 'Tiedon integrointi eri muodoista on aktiivinen tutkimusalue. Ihmiset ja yleensä biologiset hermojärjestelmät ovat varsin taitavia käyttämään monia signaaleja eri aistihavaintokentältä vuorovaikutuksessa ympäristön ja toistensa kanssa. Viimeaikainen työ syväfuusiomalleissa neuroverkkojen kautta on johtanut huomattaviin parannuksiin unimodaalisiin lähestymistapoihin puheentunnistuksen, tunnetunnistuksen ja -analyysin, tekstityksen ja kuvankuvauksen aloilla. Tutkimuksessa on kuitenkin keskitytty pääasiassa arkkitehtonisiin muutoksiin, jotka mahdollistavat erilaisten modaliteettien fuusion samalla, kun mallin monimutkaisuus on hallittavissa.', 'cs': 'Integrace informací z různých modalit je aktivní oblastí výzkumu. Lidské bytosti a obecně biologické neuronové systémy jsou docela dobře schopné využívat množství signálů z různých smyslových vnímavých polí k interakci s prostředím a navzájem. Nedávná práce na modelech hluboké fúze prostřednictvím neuronových sítí vedla k podstatnému zlepšení oproti unimodálním přístupům v oblastech, jako je rozpoznávání řeči, rozpoznávání a analýza emocí, titulky a popis obrazu. Tento výzkum se však většinou zaměřil na architektonické změny, které umožňují fúzi různých modalit a zároveň udržují zvládnutelnou složitost modelu.', 'ha': "Intra-jumawa na cikin shirin ayuka daban-daban, yana da shirin karatun na research. Mutane da, a jumla'a, ana kamfata ma'abũcin neuralli da ke amfani da wasu misãlai daga field masu hisia'a dabam, dõmin ya yi haɗi da mazaɓa da mazaɓa. Yin aikin da ke cikin motsi masu ƙari na fushi da tsarin neural sun shafi mafiya kyau a kanzu masu haɗi da shiryoyin ayuka da ke cikin wurãre-gareshi, ganin hiso da Ana yi amfani da, zane-zane. A lokacin da, wannan littafi ya fokus wa musanyi masu cikin matsayi, ko kuma yana yarda da fusar wa tsari masu daban-daban a lokacin da za'a tsare misalin mutane da za'a iya cika.", 'sk': 'Vključevanje informacij iz različnih načinov je dejavno področje raziskav. Ljudje in na splošno biološki nevronski sistemi so zelo spretni pri uporabi množice signalov iz različnih senzoričnih zaznavnih polj za interakcijo z okoljem in drugim. Nedavno delo v modelih globoke fuzije prek nevronskih omrežij je privedlo do znatnih izboljšav v primerjavi z unimodalnimi pristopi na področjih, kot so prepoznavanje govora, prepoznavanje in analiza čustev, napisi in opis slik. Vendar pa so se takšne raziskave večinoma osredotočile na arhitekturne spremembe, ki omogočajo združitev različnih modalitet, hkrati pa ohranjajo obvladljivo kompleksnost modela.', 'he': 'אינטגרציה מידע מתנאים שונים היא אזור פעיל של מחקר. בני אדם, ובכלל, מערכות עצביות ביולוגיות מתאימות להשתמש בהרבה סימנים משדות חושים שונים Recent work in deep fusion models via neural networks has led to substantial improvements over unimodal approaches in areas like speech recognition, emotion recognition and analysis, captioning and image description.  עם זאת, מחקרים כאלה התמקדו בעיקר בשינויים ארכיטקטוניים שמאפשרים למיזוג של מודרליות שונות בזמן שהמודל מורכב ניתן לנהל.', 'jv': 'Name Wong wong lan, ngomong nik, sistem anyir biyogral sing gak bener tentang nang gambar sistem sing gak bener tentang karo perbudhakan sing sampeyan sampek, iso nggawe barang sampek karo winih sampek lan nganggo sampek. gadoh sing dibenalke sampeyan karo model sing gawe nguasai enet, iso nggawe ngubah kang diolah dumadhi sing dikarepasane unimodal karo kesempatan karo perusahaan langgar, nambah alam lan anjelisasi, nggawe ngubah sak Gambar uwong. Nanging, akeh barêng-barêng langta supoyo supoyo urip lan gambaran Arkitêr sing supoyo kanggo sampeyan kanggo modalitat sing mengko sampeyan akeh modèl.', 'bo': 'ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བ་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ནི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཤིག་རེད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་མིའི་མི་ཚོགས་དང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་ན། མི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ནུས་པ་གིས་ཤེས་ཚོར་བ་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་པར་ལྟར་མང་པོ་ཞིག Recent work in deep fusion models via neural networks has led to substantial improvements over unimodal approaches in areas like speech recognition, emotion recognition and analysis, captioning and image description. འདི་ལྟ་བུ'}
{'en': 'Noisy Channel Language Model Prompting for Few-Shot Text Classification', 'ar': 'نمذجة الرسم البياني للكيان المؤقت للوسائط لفهم إجرائي للآلة متعددة الوسائط', 'fr': "Modélisation d'un graphe d'entité temporel-modal pour la compréhension de machines multimodales", 'pt': 'Modelando Gráfico de Entidade Modal-Temporal para Compreensão de Máquina Multimodal Procedimental', 'es': 'Modelado de gráficos de entidades temporal-modales para la comprensión de máquinas multimodales', 'ja': '手続き型マルチモーダルマシン理解のためのモデリング時間-モーダルエンティティグラフ', 'zh': '用多模态机器解时-模态实体图建模', 'hi': 'प्रक्रियात्मक मल्टीमॉडल मशीन समझ के लिए मॉडलिंग अस्थायी-मोडल एंटिटी ग्राफ़', 'ru': 'Моделирование графика временной модальной сущности для процедурного мультимодального машинного понимания', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Graf Aonáin Amúla-Módúil le haghaidh Tuisceana Meaisín Ilmhódúil Nós Imeachta', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση προσωρινού-τρόπου γραφήματος οντοτήτων για τη διαδικαστική πολυμερή κατανόηση μηχανών', 'hu': 'Temporal-Modal Entity Graph modellezése az eljárási multimodális gépek átlátásához', 'it': "Modellazione del grafico dell'entità temporale-modale per la comprensione procedurale della macchina multimodale", 'kk': 'Процессуалды көпModal машиналық компрессия үшін Температуралық модулдық нысандар графигін моделдеу', 'lt': 'Laikinojo modulio subjekto modeliavimo grafikas procedūriniam daugiarūšio įrenginio suvokimui', 'mk': 'Моделирање на привремено- моделен граф на ентитетите за процедурално мултимодно разбирање на машината', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'പ്രക്രിയേറ്റല്\u200d മള്\u200dമോഡിയല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ടെമ്പ്പോര്\u200dമാള്\u200d- മോഡല്\u200d എന്റിറ്റി ഗ്', 'mt': 'Mudellar tal-Grafika tal-Entità Temporali-Modali għall-Komprensjoni Proċedurali tal-Magna Multimodali', 'mn': 'Процессорын олон моделийн машины шалгалтын Температур-Моделийн бүрдлийн график модел', 'ro': 'Modelarea graficului de entitate temporal-modal pentru înțelegerea procedurală a mașinilor multimodale', 'pl': 'Modelowanie wykresu podmiotów czasowo-modalnych dla proceduralnego zrozumienia maszyn multimodalnych', 'no': 'Modellering av mellombels- modal einity- graf for prosessorske multimodal komprehension av maskinen', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Modeliranje temporalne-modalne jedinstvene grafike za procesualnu multimodalnu kompresiju mašine', 'so': 'Graf u baaraandegista dhaqaalaha ee ku meelgaarka ah ee muusikada', 'sv': 'Modellering av tids-modal entitetsdiagram för procedurell multimodal maskinförståelse', 'ta': 'செயல்படுத்தும் பல்முறை இயந்திரம் முடிப்பதற்கான தற்காலிக- மாதிரி உருப்படியாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'پرسڈرل Multimodal Machine Comprehension کے لئے تیموال-Modal Entity گراف مدل کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Моделиране на графика за времемодална структура за процедурално мултимодална машина', 'nl': 'Het modelleren van de Tijdelijke-Modale Entiteitsgrafiek voor Procedurale Multimodale Machine Inzicht', 'da': 'Modellering af tidsmæssig-modal enhedsgraf til proceduremæssig multimodal maskinforståelse', 'de': 'Modellierung temporal-modaler Entity Graph für prozedurales multimodales Maschinenverständnis', 'id': 'Modeling Graf Entitas Temporal-Modal untuk Kompresi Mesin Multimodal Prosedural', 'ko': '프로세스 다중모드 기계 이해를 위한 시제 모드 실체도 모델링', 'sw': 'Modeling Temporal-Modal Entity Graph for Procedural Multimodal Machine Comprehension', 'fa': 'نمونه\u200cبندی گراف عناصر Temporary-Modal برای تفکیر ماشین\u200cهای چندین مدل پروژه', 'tr': 'Stencils', 'sq': 'Modeling Temporal-Modal Entity Graph for Procedural Multimodal Machine Comprehension', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Name', 'hr': 'Modeliranje Temporalne-Modalne jedinstvene grafike za procesualnu multimodalnu kompresiju strojeva', 'az': 'Procedural ı Multimodal Makinelərin Kompleksiyonu üçün Temporal-Modal Entity Grafiki Modelləndirir', 'bn': 'Name', 'hy': 'Modeling Temporal-Modal Entity Graph for Procedural Multimodal Machine Comprehension', 'bs': 'Modeliranje Temporalne-Modalne entitetske grafike za procesualnu multimodalnu kompresiju mašine', 'cs': 'Modelování grafu časově-modálních entit pro procedurální multimodální porozumění strojů', 'et': 'Multimodaalse masina mõistmise ajalise ja modaalse olemi graafiku modelleerimine', 'ca': 'Modelling Temporal-Modal Entity Graph for Procedural Multimodal Machine Comprehension', 'fi': 'Temporal-Modal Entity Graph mallinnus Prosdural Multimodal Machine Compreension', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Modeliranje časovno-modalnega grafa entitete za postopkovno večmodalno razumevanje strojev', 'ha': 'Grafi na Entity na Tsarawa na Motsi na Tsarawa wa wa Kwamfyuta Mai Karawa', 'he': 'דוגמנית גוף של יחידות זמנית-מודלית להבינה של מכונת רבת-מודלית תהליך', 'bo': 'Modeling Temporal-Modal Entity Graph for Procedural Multimodal Machine Comprehension'}
{'en': 'We introduce a noisy channel approach for language model prompting in few-shot text classification. Instead of computing the likelihood of the label given the input (referred as direct models), channel models compute the conditional probability of the input given the label, and are thereby required to explain every word in the input. We use channel models for recently proposed few-shot learning methods with no or very limited updates to the language model parameters, via either in-context demonstration or prompt tuning. Our experiments show that, for both methods, channel models significantly outperform their direct counterparts, which we attribute to their stability, i.e., lower variance and higher worst-case accuracy. We also present extensive ablations that provide recommendations for when to use channel prompt tuning instead of other competitive models (e.g., direct head tuning): channel prompt tuning is preferred when the number of training examples is small, labels in the training data are imbalanced, or generalization to unseen labels is required.', 'es': 'Los documentos multimodales procedimentales (PMD) organizan las instrucciones textuales y las imágenes correspondientes paso a paso. Comprender las PMD e inducir sus representaciones para las tareas de razonamiento posteriores se denomina comprensión de máquinas multimodales procedimentales (M3C). En este estudio, abordamos el M3C procedimental a un nivel detallado (en comparación con las exploraciones existentes a nivel de documento o frase), es decir, entidad. Con una consideración delicada, modelamos la entidad tanto en su relación temporal como intermodal y proponemos un novedoso Gráfico de Entidad Temporal-Modal (TMEG). Específicamente, la estructura gráfica está formulada para capturar entidades textuales y visuales y trazar su evolución temporal-modal. Además, se introduce un módulo de agregación de gráficos para llevar a cabo la codificación y el razonamiento de gráficos. Se realizan experimentos exhaustivos en tres tareas de procedimiento M3C en un conjunto de datos tradicional RecipeQA y nuestro nuevo conjunto de datos CraftQA, que pueden evaluar mejor la generalización de TMEG.', 'ar': 'تنظم المستندات الإجرائية متعددة الوسائط (PMDs) التعليمات النصية والصور المقابلة خطوة بخطوة. يتم تعيين فهم PMDs وتحفيز تمثيلاتها لمهام التفكير النهائية على أنها فهم إجرائي متعدد الوسائط (M3C). في هذه الدراسة ، نتعامل مع M3C الإجرائي بمستوى دقيق (مقارنة بالاستكشافات الحالية على مستوى المستند أو الجملة) ، أي الكيان. مع مراعاة دقيقة ، نقوم بنمذجة الكيان في كل من علاقته الزمنية وعبر الوسائط ونقترح رسمًا بيانيًا مؤقتًا للكيان (TMEG). على وجه التحديد ، تمت صياغة هيكل الرسم البياني لالتقاط الكيانات النصية والمرئية وتتبع تطورها الزمني-النموذجي. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يتم تقديم وحدة تجميع الرسم البياني لإجراء ترميز الرسم البياني والاستدلال. يتم إجراء تجارب شاملة عبر ثلاث مهام إجرائية M3C على مجموعة البيانات التقليدية RecipeQA ومجموعة البيانات الجديدة CraftQA ، والتي يمكنها تقييم تعميم TMEG بشكل أفضل.', 'fr': "Les documents multimodaux procéduraux (PMD) organisent étape par étape les instructions textuelles et les images correspondantes. La compréhension des PMD et l'induction de leurs représentations pour les tâches de raisonnement en aval sont désignées comme Compréhension machine multimodale procédurale (M3C). Dans cette étude, nous abordons le M3C procédural à un niveau fin (par rapport aux explorations existantes au niveau d'un document ou d'une phrase), c'est-à-dire d'entité. Avec une réflexion délicate, nous modélisons l'entité à la fois dans sa relation temporelle et intermodale et proposons un nouveau graphe d'entité temporal-modal (TMEG). Plus précisément, la structure graphique est formulée pour capturer des entités textuelles et visuelles et suivre leur évolution temporo-modale. De plus, un module d'agrégation de graphes est introduit pour effectuer le codage et le raisonnement des graphes. Des expériences complètes sur trois tâches M3C procédurales sont menées sur un jeu de données traditionnel RecipeQA et notre nouveau jeu de données CraftQA, qui permet de mieux évaluer la généralisation de la TMEG.", 'pt': 'Documentos Multimodais Procedimentais (PMDs) organizam instruções textuais e imagens correspondentes passo a passo. Compreender PMDs e induzir suas representações para as tarefas de raciocínio a jusante é designado como Compreensão de Máquina Multimodal Procedimental (M3C). Neste estudo, abordamos o M3C Procedimental em um nível refinado (em comparação com as explorações existentes em um documento ou sentença), ou seja, entidade. Com consideração delicada, modelamos a entidade em sua relação temporal e modal e propomos um novo Gráfico de Entidade Temporal-Modal (TMEG). Especificamente, a estrutura do grafo é formulada para capturar entidades textuais e visuais e traçar sua evolução temporal-modal. Além disso, um módulo de agregação de gráficos é introduzido para conduzir a codificação e o raciocínio de gráficos. Experimentos abrangentes em três tarefas M3C procedurais são conduzidos em um conjunto de dados tradicional RecipeQA e nosso novo conjunto de dados CraftQA, que pode avaliar melhor a generalização do TMEG.', 'ja': 'プロシージャル・マルチモーダル・ドキュメント（ PMD ）は、テキスト命令と対応する画像を段階的に整理します。PMDを理解し、ダウンストリーム推論タスクのためにそれらの表現を誘導することは、手順的マルチモーダルマシン理解（ M 3 C ）として指定されます。この研究では、（文書または文レベルでの既存の探索と比較して）細かいレベル、つまりエンティティでの手順的M 3 Cにアプローチします。デリケートな検討により、私たちはその時間的およびクロスモーダル関係の両方でエンティティをモデル化し、新しい時間的モーダルエンティティグラフ（ TMEG ）を提案します。具体的には、グラフ構造は、テキストエンティティおよび視覚エンティティをキャプチャし、それらの時間的モーダル進化をトレースするために策定される。さらに、グラフの符号化と推論を行うためのグラフ集計モジュールを導入した。3つの手順的M 3 Cタスクにわたる包括的な実験は、従来のデータセットレシピQAと新しいデータセットクラフトQAで行われ、TMEGの一般化をより良く評価できます。', 'zh': '程序性多模式文档 (PMD) 渐举文本指令相应。 解PMD为下流所诱,指事多模态机器解(M3C)。 细粒度(与文档句见索)(则实体)近M3C。 深思熟虑,建模态关系建模于实体,建模有新时态模态实体图(TMEG)。 图形结构,为获文本及视实体而踪迹其时态变。 引入一图合模块,以施编码推理。 旧法集RecipeQA与我新数集CraftQA上为三程M3C务之综实验,可以优估TMEG推。', 'hi': 'Procedural Multimodal Documents (PMDs) पाठ्य निर्देशों और संबंधित छवियों को चरण-दर-चरण व्यवस्थित करते हैं। पीएमडी को समझना और डाउनस्ट्रीम तर्क कार्यों के लिए उनके अभ्यावेदन को प्रेरित करना प्रक्रियात्मक मल्टीमॉडल मशीन कॉम्प्रिहेंशन (एम 3 सी) के रूप में नामित किया गया है। इस अध्ययन में, हम एक ठीक-ठाक स्तर पर प्रक्रियात्मक एम 3 सी से संपर्क करते हैं (दस्तावेज़ या वाक्य स्तर पर मौजूदा अन्वेषणों की तुलना में), अर्थात, इकाई। नाजुक विचार के साथ, हम अपने अस्थायी और क्रॉस-मोडल संबंध दोनों में इकाई को मॉडल करते हैं और एक उपन्यास टेम्पोरल-मोडल एंटिटी ग्राफ (टीएमईजी) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, ग्राफ संरचना को पाठ्य और दृश्य संस्थाओं को पकड़ने और उनके अस्थायी-मोडल विकास का पता लगाने के लिए तैयार किया गया है। इसके अलावा, ग्राफ एन्कोडिंग और तर्क का संचालन करने के लिए एक ग्राफ एकत्रीकरण मॉड्यूल पेश किया जाता है। तीन प्रक्रियात्मक M3C कार्यों में व्यापक प्रयोग एक पारंपरिक डेटासेट RecipeQA और हमारे नए डेटासेट CraftQA पर आयोजित किए जाते हैं, जो TMEG के सामान्यीकरण का बेहतर मूल्यांकन कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Процедурные мультимодальные документы (PMDS) пошагово упорядочивают текстовые инструкции и соответствующие изображения. Понимание PMD и побуждение их представлений для задач логического обоснования ниже по потоку обозначается как процедурное понимание мультимодальных машин (M3C). В этом исследовании мы подходим к Процедурному M3C на мелкозернистом уровне (по сравнению с существующими исследованиями на уровне документа или предложения), то есть сущности. С деликатным учетом мы моделируем сущность как во временной, так и в кросс-модальной связи и предлагаем новый График временной-модальной сущности (TMEG). В частности, структура графа сформулирована для захвата текстовых и визуальных сущностей и отслеживания их временной модальной эволюции. Кроме того, введен модуль агрегации графов для проведения кодирования и рассуждений графов. Комплексные эксперименты по трем процедурным задачам M3C проводятся на традиционном наборе данных RecipeQA и нашем новом наборе данных CraftQA, который может лучше оценить обобщение TMEG.', 'ga': 'Eagraíonn Doiciméid Ilmhódúla Nós imeachta (PMDanna) treoracha téacsacha agus íomhánna comhfhreagracha céim ar chéim. Déantar PMDanna a thuiscint agus a n-uiríll a spreagadh le haghaidh na dtascanna réasúnaíochta iartheachtacha a shainiú mar Chuimsiú Meaisín Ilmhódúil Nós Imeachta (M3C). Sa staidéar seo, tugaimid faoi Nós Imeachta M3C ar leibhéal míne (i gcomparáid le hiniúchtaí atá ann cheana féin ar leibhéal doiciméad nó abairte), is é sin, eintiteas. Le breithniú cúramach, déanaimid múnla ar aonán ina chaidreamh ama agus trasmhódúil araon agus molaimid Graf Aonán Sealadach-Módúil úrscéal (TMEG). Go sonrach, cruthaítear struchtúr graf chun aonáin théacsúla agus amhairc a ghabháil agus a n-éabhlóid ama-mhódúil a rianú. Ina theannta sin, tugtar modúl comhiomlánaithe graif isteach chun ionchódú agus réasúnaíocht ghraif a dhéanamh. Déantar turgnaimh chuimsitheacha thar thrí thasc Nós Imeachta M3C ar thacar sonraí traidisiúnta RecipeQA agus ar ár dtacar sonraí nua CraftQA, ar féidir leo ginearálú TMEG a mheas níos fearr.', 'hu': 'Az eljárási multimodális dokumentumok lépésről lépésre rendezik a szöveges utasításokat és a megfelelő képeket. A PMD-k megértését és a downstream indokolási feladatokra való reprezentációjukat az eljárási többmodális gépi megértésnek (M3C) nevezik. Ebben a tanulmányban finom szemcsés szinten közelítjük meg az M3C-t (összehasonlítva a meglévő dokumentum- vagy mondatszintű feltárásokkal), azaz entitással. Kényes figyelemmel modellezzük az entitást időbeli és transzmodális kapcsolatában, és javasoljuk egy új Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG). Konkrétan a gráf struktúrát úgy alakították ki, hogy rögzítse a szöveges és vizuális entitásokat, és nyomon kövesse azok időbeli-modális evolúcióját. Ezenkívül egy gráf aggregációs modult vezetünk be a gráf kódolás és érvelés elvégzésére. Átfogó kísérleteket végeznek három eljárási M3C feladaton keresztül egy hagyományos adatkészleten RecipeQA és az új CraftQA adatkészleten, amelyek jobban értékelik a TMEG általánosítását.', 'el': 'Τα διαδικαστικά πολυμοπικά έγγραφα οργανώνουν οδηγίες κειμένου και αντίστοιχες εικόνες βήμα προς βήμα. Η κατανόηση των PMD και η πρόκληση των αναπαραστάσεων τους για τις εργασίες μεταγενέστερης συλλογιστικής ορίζεται ως Διαδικασία ΠολυModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). Στην παρούσα μελέτη, προσεγγίζουμε τη Διαδικασία σε ένα λεπτόκοκκο επίπεδο (σε σύγκριση με τις υπάρχουσες έρευνες σε επίπεδο εγγράφου ή πρότασης), δηλαδή οντότητα. Με λεπτή σκέψη, μοντελοποιούμε την οντότητα τόσο στην χρονική όσο και στη διαστροφική σχέση της και προτείνουμε ένα νέο Χρονικό-Τροπικό Γράφημα Οντότητας (ΤMEG). Συγκεκριμένα, η δομή γραφήματος διαμορφώνεται για να συλλάβει κειμενικές και οπτικές οντότητες και να ανιχνεύσει την χρονική-modale εξέλιξή τους. Επιπλέον, εισάγεται μια ενότητα συγκέντρωσης γραφήματος για τη διεξαγωγή κωδικοποίησης και συλλογισμού γραφήματος. Ολοκληρωμένα πειράματα σε τρεις διαδικαστικές εργασίες διεξάγονται σε ένα παραδοσιακό σύνολο δεδομένων και το νέο μας σύνολο δεδομένων το οποίο μπορεί να αξιολογήσει καλύτερα τη γενίκευση της ΤMEG.', 'it': "Documenti Multimodali Procedurali (PMD) organizzano istruzioni testuali e immagini corrispondenti passo dopo passo. Comprendere i PMD e indurre le loro rappresentazioni per i compiti di ragionamento a valle è designato come Processal MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). In questo studio, approcciamo Procedural M3C a un livello a grana fine (rispetto alle esplorazioni esistenti a livello di documento o frase), cioè entità. Con delicate considerazioni, modeliamo l'entità sia nella sua relazione temporale che cross-modale e proponiamo un nuovo Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG). Nello specifico, la struttura del grafico è formulata per catturare entità testuali e visive e tracciare la loro evoluzione temporale-modale. Inoltre, viene introdotto un modulo di aggregazione dei grafici per condurre la codifica e il ragionamento dei grafici. Esperimenti completi su tre attività procedurali M3C sono condotti su un set di dati tradizionale RecipeQA e sul nostro nuovo set di dati CraftQA, che possono valutare meglio la generalizzazione di TMEG.", 'lt': 'Procedūriniai daugiarūšio pobūdžio dokumentai rengia tekstines instrukcijas ir atitinkamus vaizdus žingsniu po žingsnio. Išsamūs PMD ir jų atstovavimas tolesnėms motyvavimo užduotims yra vadinami procedūriniu daugiarūšiu mašinų supratimu (M3C). Šiame tyrime mes artėjame prie procedūros M3C plono grūdo lygio (palyginti su esamais tyrimais dokumento ar sakinio lygiu), t. y. subjekto. Atsargiai apsvarstydami modeliuojame subjektą tiek laiko, tiek įvairiarūšio režimo santykiuose ir siūlome naują laikinojo režimo subjektų grafiką (TMEG). Specifically,  graph  structure  is  formulated to capture textual and visual entities and trace their temporal-modal evolution.  Be to, grafikų suvestinio modulis įdiegtas grafikų kodavimui ir pagrįstumui atlikti. Išsamūs eksperimentai, atliekami atliekant tris M3C procedūrines užduotis, atliekami tradiciniame duomenų rinkinyje „ReceipeQA“ ir mūsų naujame duomenų rinkinyje „CraftQA“, kuris gali geriau įvertinti TMEG generalizaciją.', 'mk': 'Процедуралните мултимодилни документи (PMD) организираат текстуални инструкции и соодветни слики чекор по чекор. Комплементирање на ПМД и индукција на нивните претставувања за задачите за понатамошно размислување се назначува процедурално мултимодилно разбирање на машината (M3C). Во оваа студија, се приближуваме до процедурата M3C на фино растено ниво (во споредба со постоечките истражувања на ниво на документ или реченица ), тоа е, ентитет. Со деликатно разгледување, ние го моделираме ентитетот во својата температурна и крстомодална врска и предложуваме нов температурно-модален ентитет граф (TMEG). Специфично, структурата на графот е формулирана за да ги фати текстуалните и визуелните ентитети и да ја следи нивната температурна-модална еволуција. Покрај тоа, се воведува модул за агрегација на графот за спроведување на кодирање и размислување на графот. Сеопфатни експерименти во текот на трите процедурални M3C задачи се спроведуваат на традиционалниот компјутер податоци Рецепт QA и нашиот нов компјутер податоци CraftQA, кој може подобро да ја процени генерализацијата на TMEG.', 'ms': 'Dokumen Prosedural Multimodal (PMD) mengatur arahan teks dan imej sepadan langkah demi langkah. Pemahaman PMD dan mengakibatkan perwakilan mereka untuk tugas alasan turun ditentukan sebagai Pemahaman Mesin MultiModal Prosedural (M3C). Dalam kajian ini, kita mendekati Prosedural M3C pada tahap yang sempurna (dibandingkan dengan eksplorasi yang ada pada tahap dokumen atau kalimat), iaitu, entiti. With delicate consideration, we model entity both in its temporal and cross-modal relation and propose a novel Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG).  Secara khusus, struktur graf dibentuk untuk menangkap entiti teks dan visual dan jejak evolusi temporal-modal mereka. Selain itu, modul agregasi graf diperkenalkan untuk mengekod graf dan alasan. Eksperimen komprensif melalui tiga tugas Procedural M3C dilakukan pada resep set data tradisional RecipeQA dan set data baru kita CraftQA, yang boleh menilai lebih baik pengumuman TMEG.', 'mt': "Id-Dokumenti Proċedurali Multimodali (PMDs) jorganizzaw struzzjonijiet testwali u stampi korrispondenti pass wara pass. Il-komprensjoni tal-PMDs u l-induzzjoni tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tagħhom għall-kompiti ta’ raġunament downstream huma indikati bħala Komprensjoni Proċedurali MultiModali tal-Makkinarju (M3C). F’dan l-istudju, a ħna nindirizzaw il-Proċedura M3C f’livell ta’ ħbub fin (meta mqabbel ma’ esplorazzjonijiet eżistenti f’livell ta’ dokument jew sentenza), jiġifieri entità. With delicate consideration, we model entity both in its temporal and cross-modal relation and propose a novel Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG).  B' mod speċifiku, l- istruttura tal- graff hija fformulata biex tinqabad entitajiet testwali u viżivi u tittraċċa l- evoluzzjoni temporali-modali tagħhom. Barra minn hekk, jiddaħħal modulu ta’ aggregazzjoni tal-graff biex iwettaq l-ikkodifikar tal-graff u r-raġunament. Esperimenti komprensivi fuq tliet kompiti Proċedurali M3C jitwettqu fuq sett ta’ dejta tradizzjonali Reċipep QA u sett ta’ dejta ġdid tagħna CraftQA, li jistgħu jevalwaw a ħjar il-ġeneralizzazzjoni tat-TMEG.", 'kk': 'Процедуралық көптеген құжаттар (PMD) мәтіндік мәліметтерді және сәйкес кескіндерді қадам қадамдастыру. ПМД және төменгі бағыттау тапсырмаларының түсініктерін түсініп, Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C) деп аталады. Бұл зерттеулерде Procedural M3C деңгейіне (құжат не сөз деңгейіндегі зерттеулермен салыстырылып) жатқан, мысалы, бөлім. Біз уақытты және көптеген қатынас үшін бөлшектерді үлгілеп, романдық Температуралық модель нысандар графигін (TMEG) қолданамыз. Сәйкес, график құрылымы мәтін және көрінетін нысандарды түсіру және уақытша модалдық эволюциясын қарау үшін формулады. Қосымша, графикалық кодтамасын және сезімдеу үшін графикалық агрегациялау модулі келтіріледі. Үш процедуралық M3C тапсырмаларындағы толық тәжірибелер әдетті деректер жинағында RecipeQA және жаңа деректер жинағымызды CraftQA жасайды. Бұл TMEG генерализациясын жақсы оқу мүмкін.', 'ml': 'പ്രക്രിയേറ്റല്\u200d മള്\u200dമോഡോള്\u200d രേഖകള്\u200d (PMDs) ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d ഉപദേശങ്ങള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പടിയിലൂടെ ചേര പിമിഡികളെ പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുകയും താഴ്വരയിലെ കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അവരുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പ്രവർത്തികമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് പ്രക്രിയേറല്\u200d മി ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രൊക്രിയേറല്\u200d എം3സിയിലേക്ക് സമീപിക്കുന്നു (നിലവിലുള്ള ഒരു രേഖ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വാക്കില്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന് സുന്ദരിതമായ ആലോചിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അതിന്റെ സമയത്തിലും ക്രിസ്മോഡല്\u200d ബന്ധത്തിലും മാതൃകയിലും ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ടെമ്പുറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d എന്റിറ്റിറ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ടെക്സ്ട്ടുളിലും കാഴ്ചയുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളും പിടികൂടുവാനും, അവയുടെ സമയത്തില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുവാനും ഗ്രാഫ് സ്റ കൂടാതെ, ഗ്രാഫ് കോഡിങ് എന്\u200dകോഡിങ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാനും ഒരു ഗ്രാഫ് ക്രാഗ്രാഗ്രാഗിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില Comprehensive experiments across three Procedural M3C tasks are conducted on a traditional dataset RecipeQA and our new dataset CraftQA, which can better evaluate the generalization of TMEG.', 'ka': 'პროცესტური მულტიმოდიალური დოკუმენტები (PMDs) ტექსტური ინსტუქციები და შესაბამისი გამოსახულებები ნაწილად გადაყენება. პროცესტური მულტიმოდიალური მაქსინის კომპრენციაზე (M3C) განსაზღვრებული PMDs და განსაზღვრებული მაქსინის განსაზღვრება. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ პროცესტური M3C-ს გადავიწყებთ კეთესტური მრავალში (წარმოიდგინეთ განსხვავებებით დოკუმენტი ან სიტყვალზე) რაც ინტერტია. ევლთკარნჲ პაჱდლვზეანვ, ნთვ მჲევლთპამვ თნრვკრთრა თ გპვმვნნჲ თ კპყჟმჲეალნჲ გპყჱკგანვ თ ოპველადამვ ნჲგთწ რვმოჲპალნთ-მჲეალნთ თნრვკრთრთ დპატ. განსაკუთრებულია, " გრაფის სტრუქტურაცია “ ფორმულია ტექსტურული და ვიზუალური ინტერტიების შესახებ და თავის ტემპალური მოდიალური ევოლუქტურაციის შენახვა. დამატებით, გრაფიკური ადგრეგურაციის მოდული გადატანა გრაფიკურაციის კოდირება და პარამენტის შესაძლებელად. სამი პროცესტური M3C დავალების შემდეგ კომპლექცირებული ექსპერიმენტები რესიპექსიკო და ჩვენი ახალი მონაცემების კომპერიმენტი CraftQA-ზე გავაკეთება, რომელიც შეუძლია უფრო უფ', 'mn': 'Процессорын олон модаль баримтууд (PMDs) textual instructions and corresponding images step by step. ПMД-г багасгаж, багасгах шалтгаан ажиллагааны төлөөлөлт нь Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C) гэж нэрлэсэн. Энэ судалгаанд бид Procedural M3C-г сайхан тарианы түвшинд (баримт эсвэл өгүүлбэрт байгаа судалгаанаас харьцуулахад) ойртож байна. Зөвхөн ойлголтын тулд бид цаг хугацааны болон олон загварын харилцаанд загварлаж, шинэ Темперал-Модул Entity График (TMEG) шинэ санал өгдөг. Тухайлбал, график бүтэц нь текст болон харагдах бүтээлүүдийг барьж, хугацааны моделийн хувьсалыг судлах боломжтой. Түүнчлэн график цуглуулах модуль график кодлох болон урьдчилан хийдэг. Гурван процессорын M3C даалгаварын даалгаварын бүрэн туршилтууд уламжлалтай өгөгдлийн санг RecipeQA болон шинэ өгөгдлийн санг CraftQA дээр ажилладаг. Энэ нь TMEG-ын ерөнхийлөгчийг илүү үнэлэх боломжтой.', 'ro': 'Documentele Multimodale Procedurale (PMD) organizează instrucțiunile textuale și imaginile corespunzătoare pas cu pas. Înțelegerea PMD și inducerea reprezentărilor acestora pentru sarcinile de raționare din aval sunt desemnate drept înțelegere procedurală multimodală a mașinilor (M3C). În acest studiu, abordăm procedural M3C la un nivel fin (comparativ cu explorările existente la nivel de document sau propoziție), adică entitate. Cu o atenție delicată, modelăm entitatea atât în relația sa temporală, cât și transmodală și propunem un nou Grafic Temporal-Modal Entity (TMEG). Mai exact, structura grafică este formulată pentru a capta entități textuale și vizuale și a urmări evoluția lor temporal-modală. În plus, este introdus un modul de agregare a graficului pentru a efectua codificarea și raționamentul graficului. Experimente cuprinzătoare pe trei sarcini procedurale M3C sunt efectuate pe un set de date tradițional RecipeQA și pe noul nostru set de date CraftQA, care pot evalua mai bine generalizarea TMEG.', 'no': 'Prosedyral multimodal dokument (PMD) organiser tekst- instruksjonar og tilsvarande bilete steg etter steg. Komprimering av PMD- ar og induserring av dei representasjonane for nedstrømme rasjonsbehandlingane er designert som prosedyrart multimodal komprehension av maskina (M3C). I denne studien når vi nærmer prosedyrart M3C på ein fin korn nivå (samanlikna med eksisterande utforskingar på eit dokument eller setningsnivå), som er entitet. Med delikata forståking modeller vi entitetet både i sin temporale og krysmodal relasjon og foreslår eit nytt Temporal- Modal Entity- Graf (TMEG). Spesifisert er graf- strukturen formert for å henta tekst- og visuelle einingar og spora dei tidlegare- modale evolusjonane. I tillegg vert eit grafikksamlingsmodul introdusert for å utføra grafikkkoding og rasjon. Kompleksive eksperimenter over tre prosedyrare M3C-oppgåver vert gjennomført på ein tradisjonell dataset RecipeQA og vår nye dataset CraftQA, som kan bedre evaluere generelliseringa av TMEG.', 'pl': 'Proceduralne dokumenty multimodalne (PMD) organizują instrukcje tekstowe i odpowiednie obrazy krok po kroku. Zrozumienie PMD i wywoływanie ich reprezentacji dla dalszych zadań rozumowania jest określane jako Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). W niniejszym opracowaniu podchodzimy do Procedural M3C na poziomie drobnoziarnistym (w porównaniu z istniejącymi badaniami na poziomie dokumentu lub zdania), czyli jednostki. Z delikatną uwagą modelujemy jednostkę zarówno w jego relacji czasowej, jak i międzymodalnej oraz proponujemy nowy wykres jednostek czasowo-modalnych (TMEG). W szczególności struktura wykresu została sformułowana, aby uchwycić istoty tekstowe i wizualne oraz śledzić ich ewolucję czasowo-modalną. Ponadto wprowadzono moduł agregacji wykresów do prowadzenia kodowania i rozumowania wykresów. Kompleksowe eksperymenty w trzech proceduralnych zadaniach M3C są przeprowadzane na tradycyjnym zestawie danych RecipeQA i naszym nowym zestawie danych CraftQA, które mogą lepiej ocenić uogólnienie TMEG.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන විශාල විශාල විශාල විදියට (PMDs) පැත්තක් විදියට සම්බන්ධ විදියට සහ පින්තූර පැත්තක සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ් PMDs සහ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා අඩුප්\u200dරේෂණ් සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ස මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි පරීක්ෂණ M3C ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් හොඳ ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ (ලිපිණියක් නැත්තම සාමාන්\u200dය සැලසුම් සමග, අපි ඒකේ කාලය සහ ක්\u200dරිස්මෝඩාල් සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ. විශේෂයෙන්,  ග්\u200dරාෆ්  සංවිධානය  ෙසංවිධානය ෙසංවිධානය ෙසංවිධානය ෙවන්නේ. පැත්තල් සහ දිහා  ඒ වගේම, ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ මොඩ්යුල් එක්ක ආරම්භ කරනවා ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්කෝඩ් එක්ක සහ හිතාව සම්ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් තුනක් ප්\u200dරධාන M3C ක්\u200dරියාවක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සූදානයක් රිසිප්QA සහ අපේ අළුත් දත්ත සූදානයක', 'so': 'Dokumentaha kala duduwan (PMDs) waxay qabanqaabiyaan hagitaanka qoraalka iyo sawirada oo u eg tallaabo. Sameynta PMDs iyo horumarinta shaqada hoose ee sababta ah waxaa loo qoraa Sameynta Masiinka kala duduwan (M3C). Waxbarashadan waxaynu ugu soo dhowaynaa heerka Procedural M3C si fiican ah (isbarbarbardhig baaritaanka joogta oo ku qoran qoraalka ama qoraalka). Sida aad u fiirsan karto, waxaynu sameynaa dhamaankeeda waqtiga ah iyo xiriirka noocyada ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal ku saabsan qoraalka ganacsiga (TMEG). Si gaar ah waxaa loo qoray dhismaha sawirka iyo waxyaabaha aragga lagu qabsado islamarkaasna lagu dabarayo bedelka qaabka ah. Waxaa intaas dheer oo lagu soo bandhigaa qalabka kalajarida oo lagu soo bandhigaa codsiga aragtida iyo sababta. Imtixaanka aasaasiga ah ee saddex shaqooyin oo ka mid ah shaqada M3C waxaa lagu sameeyaa qaab qaabilsan oo ah RecipeQA iyo taambuuggayaga cusub ee CraftQA, taasoo si wanaagsan u qiimeyn kara soo saaridda TMEG.', 'sv': 'Procedurella multimodala dokument (PMD) organiserar textinstruktioner och motsvarande bilder steg för steg. Att förstå PMD och inducera deras representationer för nedströms resonemang betecknas som Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). I denna studie närmar vi oss Procedural M3C på en finkornig nivå (jämfört med befintliga utforskningar på dokument- eller meningsnivå), det vill säga entitet. Med känslig hänsyn modellerar vi entiteten både i dess tidsmässiga och tvärmodala relation och föreslår en ny Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG). Specifikt är grafstrukturen formulerad för att fånga text och visuella entiteter och spåra deras temporal-modal evolution. Dessutom introduceras en grafaggregationsmodul för att genomföra grafkodning och resonemang. Omfattande experiment över tre procedurella M3C-uppgifter utförs på ett traditionellt dataset RecipeQA och vår nya dataset CraftQA, som bättre kan utvärdera generaliseringen av TMEG.', 'ur': 'پیدائسٹرل Multimodal Documents (PMDs) textual instructions and corresponding images step by step. PMDs کمپیٹ کرتا ہے اور ان کی نمایش ڈونسٹریم منطقی کاموں کے لئے پیشوا کرتا ہے (M3C) کے طور پر پردازشی MultiModal Machine Comprehension (پردازشی MultiModal Machine Comprehension) کا ذریعہ مقرر کیا جاتا ہے۔ اس مطالعہ میں، ہم ایک پاکیزہ دانہ سطح پر پروسدڈرل M3C کے قریب آتے ہیں (ایک دفتر یا مجلس سطح کے مطابق موجود مطالعہ کے مطابق) یعنی اتنی ہے۔ ذلیل نظر کے ساتھ، ہم اس کی موقت اور کروس موڈال رابطہ میں ایک نئی Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG) کی مدل کرتے ہیں۔ مخصوص طور پر، گراف ۔ساختار ۔ٹیکسٹل اور تصویر ایٹنیٹیوں کو پکڑنے کے لئے فرمول کیا گیا ہے اور ان کے temporal-modal evolution کے پیچھے چلو۔ اس کے علاوہ، ایک گراف جمع موڈیل گراف اکنوڈینگ اور منطقی کے لئے پیش کیے جاتے ہیں. تین پروسڈر کی M3C تاسکیوں کے درمیان مشکل آزمائش ایک سنتی ڈیٹ سٹ رسیپک کیا اور ہمارے نیا ڈیٹ سٹ کرافٹ کیا پر چلتے ہیں، جو TMEG کی عمومی آزمائش کو اچھی طرح تحقیق کر سکتا ہے.', 'ta': "செயல்பாடு பல்முறையான ஆவணங்கள் (PMDs) நிரல் கட்டளைகளை அமைத்து படிகளை படியில் ஒத்திசைக்கும் படிகளை படியாக அமை PMDகளை ஒப்பிடுதல் மற்றும் கீழ்நீர் காரணக் கூடிய பணிகளுக்கு அவர்களுடைய பங்குகளை செயல்படுத்துதல் பல மாற்று இயந்திரம் முடிப்பாக வடிவம இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் செயல்படுத்தும் M3C சரியான நிலையில் (இருக்கும் ஆவணத்தில் அல்லது வாக்கியத்தில் இருக்கும் போது ஏற்படும்)  சிறப்பான கருத்துடன், நாம் மாதிரி பொருள் தன் காலாவதியில் மற்றும் கிடைக்கும் தொடர்புகளில் இருந்தும் மாதிரி மற்றும் ஒரு புதிய வார் குறிப்பிட்டு, வரைப்படம் கட்டுப்பாடு ' உரையை பிடிக்க மற்றும் பார்வையுள்ள பொருட்களை பிடிக்க வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் காலம கூடுதலாக, வரைபடம் குறியீட்டு மற்றும் காரணங்களை செயல்படுத்த ஒரு வரைப்படுத்தல் கூற்றை அறிவிக்கப்படுகிறது. மூன்று செயலாக்கும் M3C பணிகளில் முழுமையான சோதனைகள் ஒரு பாரம்பரிய தரவு அமைப்பு RecipeQA மற்றும் எங்கள் புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பு கிராப்ட்கியூஏ செய்யப்பட்டத", 'sr': 'Proceduralni multimodalni dokumenti (PMD) organizuju tekstualne instrukcije i odgovarajuće slike korak po korak. Uključujući PMD-e i inducirajući njihove zastupe za zadatke o donjem razumijevanju određeno je kao procesualna multimodalna komprehenzija mašine (M3C). U ovom ispitivanju, približavamo se procesuralnom M3C na finom zrnom nivou (u usporedbi sa postojećim istraživanjima na nivou dokumenta ili rečenice) to je entitet. S delikatnim razmatranjem, modeliramo entitet i u njegovoj temporalnoj i krsnomodalnoj vezi i predlažemo novu temporalnu-modalnu entitetsku grafiku (TMEG). Posebno je „graf “ struktura “ formulisana kako bi uhvatili tekstualne i vizualne entitete i pratili njihovu temporalnu modalnu evoluciju. Osim toga, modul aggregacije grafika se uvede kako bi proveo kodiranje i razumljivanje grafika. Komplektivni eksperimenti u tri postupnih M3C zadataka provedeni su na tradicionalnoj seriji podataka RecipeQA i našoj novoj seriji podataka CraftQA, koja može bolje proceniti generalizaciju TMEG-a.', 'uz': "Name Name Bu taʼminotda, biz juda yaxshi darajada jarayon M3C dasturga qaramaymiz (hujjat yoki gapirish darajada qiymatiga qaraydi) bu mavzu. Ko'rinishni tasavvur qilish bilan, biz vaqt va modal aloqalaridagi hamma narsalarni modellaymiz va novel namuna- modal tizimi grafikni (TMEG) talab qilamiz. Koʻrsatilgan, matn va koʻruvchi obʼektlarni qabul qilish va vaqt- modal evolyutsiyatini qidirish mumkin. Koʻrsatish uchun grafik kodlash moduli koʻrsatiladi. Name", 'vi': 'Chương trình Tài liệu đa phương thức tổ chức hướng dẫn văn bản và hình ảnh tương ứng từng bước. Giải thích cho MPD và tạo phản ứng cho các công trình lập trình theo chế độ phụ thuộc thuộc chế đã được chỉ định như một máy khuếch đại. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi tiếp cận Thuật Quyền M3C theo một mức độ ổn định (so với các khám phá đã có tại một mức tài liệu hoặc câu, nghĩa là, thực thể. Với sự cân nhắc nhạy cảm, chúng tôi mô phỏng thực thể cả trong quan hệ thời gian và xuyên nội các và đề xuất một đồ họa thực thể thời gian mới (TMEG). Cụ thể, cấu trúc đồ thị được thiết kế để thu thập các thực thể hình ảnh và theo dõi tiến hóa thời gian. Thêm vào đó, một mô- đun tổng hợp đồ thị được nhập để thực hiện mã số và lý lẽ đồ thị. Các thí nghiệm toàn diện qua ba nhiệm vụ xử lý M3C được thực hiện trên mô hình thức thức thức mô tả truyền thống và tập tin mới của chúng ta, có thể đánh giá cao quy mô lớn TMEG hơn.', 'bg': 'Процедурните мултимодални документи организират текстови инструкции и съответните изображения стъпка по стъпка. Разбирането на ПМД и представянето на техните представи за задачите по разсъждаване надолу по веригата се определя като Процедурно многомодално разбиране на машините (М3C). В това проучване подхождаме към Процедуралния М3С на фино ниво (в сравнение със съществуващите проучвания на ниво документ или изречение), т.е. субект. С деликатно обмисляне моделираме същността както във времевата, така и в междумодалната му връзка и предлагаме нова времемодална графика на същността (ТМЕГ). По-конкретно, графичната структура е формулирана да улавя текстови и визуални единици и да проследява тяхната време-модална еволюция. В допълнение, е въведен модул за агрегиране на графики за провеждане на кодиране и разсъждения на графики. Цялостни експерименти в рамките на три Процедурни задачи М3С се провеждат върху традиционен набор от данни и нашия нов набор от данни който може да оцени по-добре обобщението на TMEG.', 'da': "Procedural Multimodal Documents (PMD'er) organiserer tekstinstruktioner og tilsvarende billeder trin for trin. Forståelse af PMD'er og fremkaldelse af deres repræsentationer for de efterfølgende ræsonnementsopgaver betegnes som Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). I denne undersøgelse nærmer vi os Procedural M3C på et finkornet niveau (sammenlignet med eksisterende udforskning på et dokument- eller sætningsniveau), det vil sige entitet. Med nøje overvejelser modellerer vi enheden både i dens tidsmæssige og tværmodale relation og foreslår en ny Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG). Specielt er grafstruktur formuleret til at fange tekstlige og visuelle enheder og spore deres tids-modale udvikling. Derudover introduceres et grafaggregationsmodul til at udføre grafkodning og ræsonnement. Omfattende eksperimenter på tværs af tre Procedural M3C opgaver udføres på et traditionelt datasæt RecipeQA og vores nye datasæt CraftQA, som bedre kan evaluere generaliseringen af TMEG.", 'nl': "Procedural Multimodal Documents (PMD's) organiseren stap voor stap tekstuele instructies en bijbehorende afbeeldingen. Het begrijpen van PMD's en het induceren van hun representaties voor de downstream redeneertaken wordt aangeduid als Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). In dit onderzoek benaderen we Procedural M3C op een fijnkorrelig niveau (vergeleken met bestaande verkenningen op document- of zinnenniveau), dat wil zeggen entiteit. Met delicate overweging modelleren we entiteiten zowel in haar temporele als crossmodale relatie en stellen we een nieuwe Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG) voor. Specifiek is de grafiekstructuur geformuleerd om tekstuele en visuele entiteiten vast te leggen en hun temporele-modale evolutie te traceren. Daarnaast wordt een grafiekaggregatiemodule geïntroduceerd om grafiekcodering en redenering uit te voeren. Uitgebreide experimenten met drie procedurele M3C taken worden uitgevoerd op een traditionele dataset RecipeQA en onze nieuwe dataset CraftQA, die de generalisatie van TMEG beter kan evalueren.", 'de': 'Procedural Multimodal Documents (PMDs) organisieren Textanweisungen und entsprechende Bilder Schritt für Schritt. Das Verständnis von PMDs und das Induzieren ihrer Repräsentationen für die nachgelagerten Denkaufgaben wird als Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C) bezeichnet. In dieser Studie nähern wir Procedural M3C auf einer feinkörnigen Ebene (verglichen mit bestehenden Explorationen auf Dokument- oder Satzebene), also Entität. Mit delikater Betrachtung modellieren wir Entitäten sowohl in ihrer zeitlichen als auch in ihrer crossmodalen Beziehung und schlagen ein neuartiges Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG) vor. Insbesondere wird die Graphenstruktur formuliert, um textuelle und visuelle Entitäten zu erfassen und deren zeitliche-modale Entwicklung zu verfolgen. Darüber hinaus wird ein Graphenaggregationsmodul eingeführt, um Graphenkodierung und Argumentation durchzuführen. Umfangreiche Experimente über drei procedurale M3C-Aufgaben werden an einem traditionellen Datensatz RecipeQA und unserem neuen Datensatz CraftQA durchgeführt, mit dem die Verallgemeinerung von TMEG besser bewertet werden kann.', 'ko': '프로그램 다중모드 문서(PMD)는 텍스트 명령어와 해당 이미지를 단계적으로 구성합니다.PMD를 이해하고 하류 추리 임무에 대한 표현을 귀납하는 것을 프로그램적 다중모드 기기 이해(M3C)라고 한다.본 연구에서 우리는 세립도 단계(문서나 문장 단계의 기존 탐색에 비해)에서 프로그램성 M3C, 즉 실체에 가깝다.자세하게 고려한 토대에서 우리는 실체의 시제와 다중모드 관계를 모델링하고 새로운 시제 모드 실체도(TMEG)를 제시했다.구체적으로 말하면 도형 구조는 텍스트와 시각적 실체를 포착하고 그들의 시간 모드의 진화를 추적하기 위한 것이다.도형 집합 모듈을 도입해 도형 인코딩과 추리를 진행했다.전통적인 데이터 집합인 RecipeQA와 우리의 새로운 데이터 집합인 CraftQA에서 세 가지 프로그램적인 M3C 임무를 종합적으로 실험했는데 이 두 데이터 집합은 TMEG의 범위화를 더욱 잘 평가할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Dokumen Procedural Multimodal (PMD) mengatur instruksi tekstual dan gambar yang sesuai langkah demi langkah. Mengumpulkan PMD dan menginduksi representation mereka untuk tugas alasan turun ditunjukkan sebagai Pemahaman Prosedural MultiModal Machine (M3C). Dalam studi ini, kami mendekati Proyeksional M3C pada tingkat yang baik (dibandingkan dengan eksplorasi yang ada di tingkat dokumen atau kalimat), yaitu, entitas. Dengan pertimbangan halus, kita model entitas dalam hubungan temporal dan transmodal dan melamar sebuah Graf Entitas Temporal-Modal (TMEG) novel. Secara spesifik, struktur grafik dibuat untuk menangkap entitas tekstual dan visual dan melacak evolusi temporal-modal mereka. In addition, a graph aggregation module is introduced to conduct graph encoding and reasoning.  Eksperimen komprensif melalui tiga tugas Procedural M3C dilakukan pada resep data tradisional RecipeQA dan dataset baru kita CraftQA, yang dapat lebih baik mengevaluasi generalisasi TMEG.', 'sw': 'Taarifa nyingine za utaratibu (PMDs) huandaa maelekezo ya ujumbe na picha zinazoshirikisha hatua kwa hatua. Kufananisha chama cha PMD na kuwafanya uwakilishi wao kwa kazi zinazoelezea mto wa chini ya mito imetengenezwa kama upatikanaji wa Mashindano ya Utawala (M3C). In this study, we approach Procedural M3C at a fine-grained level (compared with existing explorations at a document or sentence  level), that is, entity.  Kwa kutafakari vizuri, tunaweka vifaa vyote katika mahusiano yake ya muda na kuvuka mipango na kupendekeza karatasi ya kiraia ya muda mfupi (TMEG). Kwa ujumla, muundo wa picha ’ umeundwa kushika vifaa vya msingi na kuona na kufuatilia mabadiliko yao ya muda mrefu. Zaidi ya hayo, kituo cha upigaji picha kinaonyesha kufanya uchunguzi wa picha na maana. Majaribio makubwa katika majukumu matatu ya M3C yanaendeshwa kwenye seti ya takwimu za kitamaduni ya RecipeQA na taarifa zetu mpya CraftQA, ambayo inaweza kutathmini uzalishaji wa TMEG.', 'tr': "Metini modal Senedler PMD'leri doldurmak we aşağı aklawlama görevleri üçin önleşenlerini Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C) diýip kabul edildi. Bu araşdyrmada, biz Procedural M3C'a fin deplerde yaklaşýarys (bar keşfedilmeler bir sened we sözleriň derejesinde diýip ýakynlaşýarys), diýmek isleýän bir hedef. Kiçiräk düşünseler bolsa, biz munuň hem zamanyň hem modal baglaýyşynda örän nusgasyny görkezip we kitabyny Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG) täze berýäris. Adatça,  graf  struktur  is  textual and visual entities captured and trace their temporal-modal evolution. Üstden, grafik ködlemeleri we razylygy çykarmak üçin bir grafik toplama modüli girdirildi. TMEG generalizasyny gowy çykyp biler diýip üç Procedural M3C zadynyň arasynda döredilen deneyler çykylýar.", 'af': "Proseduraal Multimodale Dokumente (PMDs) organiseer tekstuele instruksies en ooreenstemmende beelde stap by stap. Versameling van PMDs en die voorstellings van hulle voorstellings vir die onderstreem redekende taak word as Proceduraal MultiModal Masjien Versameling (M3C) gedefinieer. In hierdie studie kom ons toe na Proseduraal M3C by 'n fyn-graad vlak (vergelyk met bestaande uitvoerings by 'n dokument of seting “ vlak), dit is entiteit. Met delikate aandag, ons model entiteit beide in sy tydelike en kruismodaal verwanting en voorstel 'n novele Temporaal-Modaal Entiteit Graf (TMEG). Spesifieke , graaf “ struktuur “ is “ geformeer om tekstuele en visuele entiteite te vang en hulle tydelike- modale evolusie te soek. In addition, a graph aggregation module is introduced to conduct graph encoding and reasoning. Kompleksiewe eksperimente oor drie prosedureel M3C-opdragte word gedoen op 'n tradisionele datastel RecipeQA en ons nuwe datastel CraftQA, wat die generalisering van TMEG kan beter evalueer.", 'am': 'ሁኔታ የፓርቲካውያንን አቀማመጥ እና የውይይት ውይይት አካባቢ ስራዎችን ለመቀላቀል ማሻሻል (M3C) የተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ በፕሮግራሙር M3C በመልካም ደረጃን እናቀርባለን (ከሥልጣን ወይም ከክፍለ ደረጃ ጋር በተያያየ) ይህ አካል ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም አስተያየት፣ በጊዜው እና በክፍለ ግንኙነት እና የክፍል ግንኙነት እና የዘላለም ትምህርት-ሞዴል የድምፅ ግንኙነት (TMEG) እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይ፣ graph /structure ፣ ጽሑፍ እና ራእይ አካላትን ለመያዝ እና በጊዜው-ሞዴል ልውጤታቸውን ለማሳየት የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም ላይ የgraph አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ ማድረግ እና ማሰናከል ነው፡፡ በሦስት ፕሮግራም M3C ስራ ላይ የተሞላ ፈተናዎች በተባለው የዳታዊ መቀበል ቅድሚያ እና አዲስ የዳታ መክፈቻችንን የTMEG አቀማመጥ በማስተካከል ይችላል፡፡', 'hr': 'Proceduralni multimodalni dokumenti (PMD) organiziraju tekstualne upute i odgovarajuće slike korak po korak. Uključujući PMD-e i inducirajući njihove zastupe za zadatke o donjem razumijevanju smatra se procesuralnom multimodalnom komprencijom stroja (M3C). U ovom ispitivanju, približavamo se procesuralnom M3C na finom zrnom nivou (u usporedbi s postojećim istraživanjima na razini dokumenta ili rečenice “ razini”), to je entitet. S delikatnim razmatranjem, modeliramo entitet i u svom temporalnom i krsnomodalnom odnosu i predlažemo novi grafik Temporalne-Modalne Entitete (TMEG). Posebno je „graf “ struktura “ formulirana kako bi uhvatili tekstualne i vizualne entitate i pratili njihovu privremenu modalnu evoluciju. Osim toga, modul aggregacije grafika se uvodi za provođenje kodiranja i razumanja grafika. Osobuhvatljivi eksperimenti u tri postupnih M3C zadatka provedeni su na tradicionalnoj seriji podataka RecipeQA i našoj novoj seriji podataka CraftQA, što može bolje procijeniti generalizaciju TMEG-a.', 'hy': 'Պատահական բազմամոդալ փաստաթղթերը կազմակերպում են տեքստային ուղղություններ և համապատասխան պատկերներ քայլ առ քայլ: ՄԻԱՎ-ի ընդհանուր պատկերացումը և նրանց ներկայացումը հետագա մտածողական առաջադրանքների համար նշանակվում է ՄԻԱՎ-ի ընդհանուր գործընթաց (M3C). Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք մոտենում ենք M3C-ի գործընթացին նրբագեղ մակարդակում (համեմատելով փաստաթղթի կամ նախադասության մակարդակի գոյություն ունեցող ուսումնասիրությունների հետ), այսինքն, առանձին: Հետաքրքիր հաշվի առնելով, մենք մոդելավորում ենք էությունը, ինչպես ժամանակական, ինչպես նաև խաչմոդալ հարաբերության մեջ, և առաջարկում ենք նոր ժամանակական-մոդալ էության գրաֆ (ԹՄԳ). Specifically,  graph  structure  is  formulated to capture textual and visual entities and trace their temporal-modal evolution.  Ավելին, գծագրի ագրեգացիայի մոդուլը ներկայացվում է գծագրի կոդավորման և մտածողության համար: Comprehensive experiments across three Procedural M3C tasks are conducted on a traditional dataset RecipeQA and our new dataset CraftQA, which can better evaluate the generalization of TMEG.', 'az': "Procedural Multimodal Documents (PMDs) textual instructions and corresponding images step by step organize. PMDlər ilə birləşdirilən və düşürülmüş razılıq işləri üçün təşkil etdiklərini Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C) kimi təşkil edilir. Bu təhsil içində, Procedural M3C-ə yaxınlaşırıq ki, sünbül dənələrdə (məskənin keşfedilməsi və ya cümlənin səviyyəsi ilə müəyyən edilmiş bir səviyyədə). Nəfsiz fikirləşdirilmiş olaraq, hər ikisinin temporal və cross-modal ilişkisində modelləşdiririk və yeni Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG) təklif edirik. Şübhəsiz ki, graf “ quruluşu ” textual and visual entities capture and trace their temporal-modal evolution . Bütün bunlardan sonra, graf kodlaması və razılıq işləməsi üçün grafik toplama modulu daxil edilir. Üç Procedural M3C işləri arasında müxtəlif təcrübələr TMEG'nin generalizasyonunu daha yaxşı değerləşdirə bilər.", 'fa': 'مدارک\u200cهای متعدد مدال (PMDs) دستورات متن و تصاویر متعلق به قدم برگزار می\u200cکنند. تغییر PMDs و تولید نمایش\u200cهایشان برای کار منطقی پایین\u200cترین پایین به عنوان تغییر دستگاه MultiModal Procedural (M3C) نامیده می\u200cشود. در این مطالعه، ما در سطح دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه به پروژه M3C نزدیک می\u200cشویم (در مقایسه با تحقیقات موجود در یک سند یا سطح جمله) یعنی متحد. با توجه به اندازه ذره\u200cای، ما یک entity مدل می\u200cکنیم هر دو در ارتباط موقتی و متوسط مدل آن و یک گراف جدید عناصر Temporal-Modal Entity (TMEG) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. دقیقاً ساختار گراف ؛ برای گرفتن عناصر متن و دیده\u200cها فرمول می\u200cشود و تکامل مدال موقتی آنها را ردیابی می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، یک مدول جمع گراف برای انجام رمزبندی و منطقی گراف معرفی می شود. آزمایش\u200cهای کامل در سه وظیفه Procedural M3C روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای سنتی RecipeQA و مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید ما CraftQA انجام می\u200cشود، که می\u200cتواند بهتر ارزیابی عمومی TMEG را ارزیابی کند.', 'bn': 'প্রক্রিয়াল মাল্টিমোডাল ডকুমেন্ট (পিএমডি) টেক্সচুয়াল নির্দেশ আয়োজন করুন এবং পদক্ষেপে ছবির সাথে সংশ্লি পিএমডিকে তুলনা করা এবং নীচের নদীর কারণে কাজের প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করা হচ্ছে প্রক্রিয়াল মাল্টিমোডাল মেশিন (এম৩সি) হিসেবে। এই গবেষণায় আমরা প্রক্রিয়াল এম৩সির কাছে সুন্দর স্তরে যুক্ত হয়েছি (একটি নথিপত্র অথবা শাস্তি স্তরে বিস্ফোরণের সাথে তুলনায়) যা হচ্ছে সেটা। পরিস্থিতি বিবেচনার সাথে আমরা তাদের সাময়িক এবং মোডাল সম্পর্কের মধ্যে মডেল বৈশিষ্ট্য উভয়কে মডেল করি এবং একটি নভেল টেম্পুরাল-মডেল এন্টি বিশেষ করে, টেক্সচুয়াল এবং দৃশ্য বস্তুগুলো ধরার জন্য গ্রাফ `কাঠামো তৈরি করা হয়েছে এবং তাদের সময়-মডেল বিবর্তন অনুসন্ধান করার জন্য। তাছাড়াও, গ্রাফ এনকোডিং এবং কোন কারণ করার জন্য একটি গ্রাফ অ্যাগ্রেজেশন মডিউল চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে। তিনটি প্রক্রিয়াল এম৩সি কাজের মাধ্যমে সম্পূর্ণ পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে ঐতিহ্যবাহী ডাটাসেট রিপিকিউএ এবং আমাদের নতুন ডাটাসেট ক্রাফ্টকিউএ, যা টিএমজির', 'ca': "Els Documents Procedurals Multimodals (PMD) organitzen instruccions textuals i imatges correspondents pas a pas. Comprendre PMD i induir les seves representacions per a les tasques de raonament avall es designa com a Comprensió Procedural MultiModal Machine (M3C). In this study, we approach Procedural M3C at a fine-grained level (compared with existing explorations at a document or sentence  level), that is, entity.  Amb consideració delicada, modelem una entitat tant en la seva relació temporal com transmodal i proposem un nou Gràfic Temporal-Modal d'Entitat (TMEG). En concret, l'estructura del gràfic està formulada per capturar entitats textuals i visuals i rastrear la seva evolució temporal-modal. In addition, a graph aggregation module is introduced to conduct graph encoding and reasoning.  Un conjunt de dades tradicional RecipeQA i el nostre nou conjunt de dades CraftQA, que poden evaluar millor la generalització de TMEG, es fan experiments complets en tres tasques M3C Procedural.", 'bs': 'Proceduralni multimodalni dokumenti (PMD) organiziraju tekstualne instrukcije i odgovarajuće slike korak po korak. Uključujući PMD-e i inducirajući njihove zastupe za zadatke o donjem razumijevanju određeno je kao proceduralna multimodalna komprehenzija mašine (M3C). U ovom ispitivanju, približavamo se procesuralnom M3C na finom zrnom nivou (u usporedbi s postojećim istraživanjima na nivou dokumenta ili rečenice „ razini“), to je entitet. S delikatnim razmatranjem, modeliramo entitet i u njegovoj temporalnoj i krsnomodalnoj vezi i predlažemo novi grafik Temporalne-Modalne Entitete (TMEG). Posebno je „graf “ struktura “ formulirana kako bi uhvatili tekstualne i vizualne entitate i pratili njihovu temporalnu modalnu evoluciju. Osim toga, modul aggregacije grafika se uvodi za provođenje kodiranja i razumanja grafika. Uhvatljivi eksperimenti na tri postupna M3C zadatka provedeni su na tradicionalnoj seriji podataka RecipeQA i našoj novoj seriji podataka CraftQA, koja može bolje procijeniti generalizaciju TMEG-a.', 'sq': 'Dokumentet Procedural Multimodal (PMDs) organizojnë udhëzime tekstuale dhe imazhe korrespondente hap pas hapi. Comprehending PMDs and inducing their representations for the downstream reasoning tasks is designated as Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C).  Në këtë studim, ne i afrohemi Proçedurës M3C në një nivel të hollë (krahasuar me eksplorimet ekzistuese në një nivel dokumenti apo fjalimi ), që do të thotë, njësi. Me konsideratë delikate, ne modelojmë njësinë si në lidhjen e saj temporale ashtu edhe ndërmodali dhe propozojmë një grafik të ri të njësisë temporale-modali (TMEG). Veçanërisht, struktura e grafikut është formuluar për të kapur njësitë tekstuale dhe vizuale dhe për të gjurmuar evolucionin e tyre temporal-modal. Përveç kësaj, një modul agregimi grafik futet për të kryer kodimin dhe arsyetimin e grafikut. Eksperimente të përgjithshme nëpërmjet tre detyrave procedurale M3C kryehen në një grup të dhënash tradicionale RecipeQA dhe grupin tonë të ri të dhënash CraftQA, që mund të vlerësojnë më mirë gjeneralizimin e TMEG.', 'cs': 'Procedurální multimodální dokumenty (PMD) organizují textové instrukce a odpovídající obrázky krok za krokem. Porozumění PMD a navodit jejich reprezentaci pro následné úlohy uvažování je označeno jako Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). V této studii přistupujeme k Procedurálnímu M3C na jemné úrovni (ve srovnání s existujícími průzkumy na úrovni dokumentu nebo věty), tedy entity. S delikátním ohledem modelujeme entitu jak v jejím časovém, tak crossmodálním vztahu a navrhujeme nový Temporálně-Modální Entity Graph (TMEG). Konkrétně je grafová struktura formulována tak, aby zachytila textové a vizuální entity a sledovala jejich časově-modální vývoj. Kromě toho je představen modul agregace grafů pro provádění kódování a uvažování grafů. Komplexní experimenty napříč třemi procedurálními M3C úlohami jsou prováděny na tradiční datové sadě RecipeQA a naší nové datové sadě CraftQA, která dokáže lépe vyhodnotit zobecnění TMEG.', 'et': 'Multimodaalsed menetlusdokumendid (PMD) korraldavad tekstijuhised ja vastavad pildid samm-sammult. PMD-de mõistmine ja nende esinduste esitamine järgmise etapi arutlusülesannete täitmiseks loetakse menetluslikuks mitmemodualseks masinaks mõistmiseks (M3C). Käesolevas uuringus läheneme protseduurilisele M3C-le peenrahalisel tasandil (võrreldes olemasolevate uuringutega dokumendi või lause tasandil), st olemusel. Õrna kaalutlusega modelleerime olemust nii selle ajalises kui ka transmodaalses seoses ning pakume välja uue Temporal-Modal Entity Graph (TMEG). Täpsemalt on graafilise struktuuri sõnastatud selleks, et jäädvustada tekstuaalseid ja visuaalseid olemusi ning jälgida nende ajalise-modaalse evolutsiooni. Lisaks on graafikute kodeerimiseks ja arutlemiseks kasutusele võetud graafikute koondamise moodul. Põhjalikud katsed kolme protseduurilise M3C ülesandega viiakse läbi traditsioonilise andmekogumi RecipeQA ja meie uue andmekogumi CraftQA abil, mis suudab paremini hinnata TMEG üldistamist.', 'fi': 'Menettelyasiakirjat (PMD) järjestävät tekstiohjeet ja vastaavat kuvat vaiheittain. PMD:ien ymmärtäminen ja niiden edustamien esittäminen jatkojalostustehtävissä on nimetty menettelylliseksi monimodaaliseksi koneymmärrykseksi (M3C). Tässä tutkimuksessa lähestymme Proceduraali M3C:tä hienojakoisella tasolla (verrattuna olemassa oleviin tutkimus- tai asiakirjatasolla), eli entiteetillä. Hienovaraisesti tarkasteltuna mallinnamme entiteettiä sekä ajallisessa että intermodaalisessa suhteessa ja ehdotamme uutta Temporal-Modal Entity Graphia (TMEG). Erityisesti graafirakenne on muotoiltu kuvaamaan tekstuaalisia ja visuaalisia entiteettejä ja jäljittämään niiden ajallis-modaalista kehitystä. Lisäksi graafien aggregaatiomoduuli esitellään graafien koodaamiseen ja päättelyyn. Kattavat kokeilut kolmessa Procedural M3C -tehtävässä tehdään perinteisellä RecipeQA-aineistolla ja uudella CraftQA-aineistollamme, joilla voidaan paremmin arvioida TMEG:n yleistymistä.', 'jv': 'structural navigation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang digawe iki, kita dadi kang Procedural M3 C ning nambah dibuturan (nambah karo istrasi sing dibutuhke nang dokumen obang kapan ,) sumelan, dadi, isih. Wurung indeksi, kita nambah entis dong sampeyan kelas nang resmi dadi karo mulasal karo perusahaan modal Laptop" and "Desktop politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Name', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name @ action: button Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã kusantar da Shirin M3 C da wani daraja mai kyau (sami da masu jarraba da ke cikin wata takarda ko wata kalma), shi ne gaske. Ko da kafin da aka ƙayyade, muna motsa shaidu duk a cikin mazaɗarsa kuma masu haɗi da tsohon-faɗi kuma muna buƙata wani grafi na takardar-Mataimin da aka Temaɗa (TMEG). A ƙayyade, ana ƙayyade ` layin graph' dõmin a kãma abun matsayi da masu gani kuma ya yi amfani da kwamfyutan-modal-lokaci. Da wannan, za'a introduce modulen faɗa ɗawa na graph dõmin a yi aikin kodi na graph da yin inganci. Comprehensive experiments across three Procedural M3C tasks are conducted on a traditional dataset RecipeQA and our new dataset CraftQA, which can better evaluate the generalization of TMEG.", 'sk': 'Postopkovni multimodalni dokumenti (PMD) korak za korakom organizirajo besedilna navodila in ustrezne slike. Razumevanje PMD in spodbujanje njihovih predstavitev za naloge razmišljanja v nadaljnji verigi se imenuje Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C). V tej študiji pristopamo k procesnemu M3C na drobnozrnati ravni (v primerjavi z obstoječimi raziskavami na ravni dokumenta ali stavka), to je entiteti. Z občutljivim premislekom modeliramo entiteto tako v časovnem kot medmodalnem razmerju ter predlagamo nov časovno-modalni graf entitete (TMEG). Natančneje, grafska struktura je oblikovana tako, da zajema besedilne in vizualne entitete ter sledi njihovi časovno-modalni evoluciji. Poleg tega je uveden modul združevanja grafov za izvajanje kodiranja grafov in razmišljanja. Obsežni eksperimenti v treh procesnih M3C opravilih so izvedeni na tradicionalnem naboru podatkov RecipeQA in našem novem naboru podatkov CraftQA, ki lahko bolje oceni posploševanje TMEG.', 'he': 'מסמכים רבים מודליים הנהליים (PMDs) מארגנים הוראות טקסטיות ותמונות מתאימות צעד אחר צעד. משימות ההיגיון התחתוניות המושלמות (PMDs) המכילות והתעוררת מייצגותיהם למשימות ההיגיון התחתוניות מונחות כמבינה המכונה המודית הנהלית (M3C). במחקר הזה, אנו מתקרבים לתהליך M3C ברמה גבוהה (בהשוואה לחקירות קיימות ברמה מסמך או משפט ), כלומר, יחידה. עם שיקול עדין, אנו דוגמנים יחידה גם במערכת היחסים הזמנית וגם במערכת היחסים המודלית שלה ומציעים גרף של יחידה הזמנית-מודלית (TMEG) חדש. במיוחד, הגרף המבנה מתייצב כדי לתפוס יחידות טקסטוליות ויזואליות ולעקוב אחר האבולוציה הזמנית-מודלית שלהם. בנוסף, מודול אגרוף גרף מוצג כדי לבצע קידוד גרף והגיון. ניסויים מלאים במהלך שלושה משימות M3C הניתוחים מתבצעים על קבוצת נתונים מסורתית קבוצת QA והקבוצת נתונים החדשה שלנו CraftQA, אשר יכול להעריך טוב יותר את הגנרליזציה של TMEG.', 'bo': 'ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་སྣ་མང་ཆོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ(PMDs)ཡི་གེའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་པའི་བརྙན་རིས མཇུག་བསྡུ་བཞིན་པའི་PMDs དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་རྣམ་པ་མཇུག་བསྡུ་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་ཏེ།Procedural MultiModal Machine Comprehension (M3C) འོན་ཀྱང་། ཕྱོགས་སྐོར་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཡར་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཉེས་མཚམས་ཤིག་དང་། དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་དག་གསལ་བསམ་བློ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ངེད་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་ལམ་ལུགས་པའི་མཐུན་སྣང་དང་གསར་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག དམིགས་བསལ་ནི། graph  structure  is  formulated to capture textual and visual entities and trace their temporal-modal evolution. དེ་བསྡུས་ན། པར་རིས་བསྡུས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་སྐབས། TMEG ཡི་གྲངས་སུ་འབོར་བའི་ལས་སྦྱོར་གྱི་M3C ལས་ཀ་ལ་བརྩོན་ལས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཆེན་དག་གི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཕྱོགས་དང་ང་ཚོའི་གནས་སྡུད་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསར་'}
{'en': '\\infty-former: Infinite Memory Transformer', 'ar': 'توليد الرسم البياني التوضيحي عبر نماذج لغوية مُدرَّبة مسبقًا: دراسة تجريبية مع التعلم التقابلي', 'fr': "Génération de graphes d'explication via des modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés\xa0: une étude empirique avec apprentissage contrastif", 'es': 'Generación de gráficos explicativos a través de modelos lingüísticos preentrenados: un estudio empírico con aprendizaje contrastivo', 'pt': 'Geração de Gráficos de Explicação via Modelos de Linguagem Pré-treinados: Um Estudo Empírico com Aprendizagem Contrastiva', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के माध्यम से स्पष्टीकरण ग्राफ पीढ़ी: कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग के साथ एक अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルを介した説明グラフの生成：対照的な学習との経験的研究', 'zh': '基于预训言模之说图,基于比学之实证', 'ru': 'Генерация графа объяснения с помощью предварительно обученных языковых моделей: эмпирическое исследование с контрастным обучением', 'ga': 'Míniú Grafa a Ghiniúint trí Mhúnlaí Teanga Réamhoilte: Staidéar Eimpíreach le Foghlaim Chodarsnachta', 'el': 'Δημιουργία γραφικών επεξηγήσεων μέσω προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων: Μια εμπειρική μελέτη με αντιφατική μάθηση', 'hu': 'Magyarázat Graf generálás előképzett nyelvi modelleken keresztül: empirikus tanulmány kontrasztív tanulással', 'it': 'Generazione di grafici attraverso modelli linguistici pre-formati: uno studio empirico con apprendimento contrastante', 'ka': 'პარამეტრების გრაფიკის შექმნა წინაშექმნილი ენის მოდელების გამოყენებაში: კონტრესტიგური სწავლების იმპერიკალური სწავლება', 'lt': 'Paaiškinimo grafiko generacija naudojant iš anksto parengtus kalbos modelius: empirinis tyrimas su kontrastiniu mokymu', 'mk': 'Генерација на објаснувачки график преку предобучени јазички модели: Империска студија со контрастивно учење', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Graf Penjelasan melalui Model Bahasa Latihan Terdahulu: Pelajaran Empirikal dengan Belajar Kontrastif', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгілері арқылы таңдау графикалық түсініктемесі: Контрастық оқыту үшін империкалық оқыту', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dപില്\u200d എക്സ്പ്ലാനേഷന്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് സംവിധാനം: കോണ്\u200dട്രാസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d പഠ', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Spjegazzjoni Grafika permezz ta’ Mudelli tal-Lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel: Studju Impiriku b’Tagħlim Kontrastiv', 'mn': 'Тодорхойлолт Графын төрөл өмнө сургалтын хэл загваруудын хувьд', 'no': 'Generering av utforskingsgraf gjennom før- trengte språk- modeller: Ein empirisk studie med kontrastiv læring', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Generacija grafika objašnjenja preko predobučenih jezičkih modela: Empirička studija sa kontrastivnim učenjem', 'pl': 'Generowanie wykresów wyjaśnień za pomocą wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych: badanie empiryczne z uczeniem się kontrastywnym', 'ro': 'Generarea graficului de explicație prin modele lingvistice pre-instruite: un studiu empiric cu învățare contrastivă', 'sv': 'Förklaring Grafgenerering via förberedda språkmodeller: En empirisk studie med kontrastivt lärande', 'so': 'Qoraalka fasaxda lagu soo bandhigi karo', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகளின் மூலம் வெளியீட்டு வரைகலை உருவாக்கம்: ஒரு விருப்பமான ஆய்வு தொடர்பு கற்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giải thích cho cấu hình đồ họa qua mẫu ngôn ngữ được đào tạo: Một nghiên cứu đầy tham vọng với học tương phản', 'bg': 'Генериране на графика чрез предварително обучени езикови модели: емпирично изследване с контрастивно обучение', 'da': 'Forklaring Grafgenerering via forududdannede sprogmodeller: Et empirisk studie med kontrastiv læring', 'nl': 'Uitleg Grafiek genereren via voorgetrainde taalmodellen: een empirische studie met contrastief leren', 'hr': 'Generacija grafika objašnjenja preko predobučenih jezičkih modela: Empiričko ispitivanje s kontrastivnim učenjem', 'de': 'Erklärungsgrafeneration mittels vortrainierter Sprachmodelle: Eine empirische Studie mit kontrastivem Lernen', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 통해 해석도 생성: 비교 학습의 실증 연구', 'id': 'Generasi Graf Penjelasan melalui Model Bahasa Terlatih Sebuah Studi Kekaisaran Dengan Belajar Kontrastif', 'fa': 'توضیح توضیح گراف از طریق مدل های پیش آموزش زبان: یک مطالعه امپراتیک با یادگیری متفاوتی', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa Graphi ya Uelelezi kupitia Models of Pre-trained Language: A Empire Study with Contrastive Learning', 'tr': 'Ta첵첵arlama', 'af': "Verduideling Graf Generasie deur vooraf- opgelei taal Modelle: ' n Enigeriese Studie met kontrastiewe Leer", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i grafikut të shpjegimit nëpërmjet modeleve të gjuhës paratrajnuar: Një studim perandor me mësim kontrastues', 'hy': 'Պատկերացման գրաֆի ստեղծումը նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների միջոցով. Կապրիկական ուսումնասիրություն հակադրական սովորելով', 'az': '∆Źvv…ôlc…ô t…ôhsil edilmiŇü Dil Modell…ôri vasit…ôsil…ô S…ôf…ôrl…ôndiril…ôn Grafik M…ôxluqatńĪ: Kontrast √Ėyr…ônm…ôsi il…ô Empirical Study', 'bn': 'Explanation Graph Generation via Pre-trained Language Models: An Empirical Study with Contrastive Learning', 'bs': 'Generacija grafika objašnjenja preko predobučenih jezičkih modela: Empirička studija sa kontrastivnim učenjem', 'cs': 'Generování grafů vysvětlení pomocí předškolených jazykových modelů: empirická studie s kontrastivním učením', 'ca': 'Explication Graph Generation via Pre-Trained Language Models: An Empirical Study with Contrastive Learning', 'et': 'Selgitus Graafiku genereerimine eelõpetatud keelemudelite kaudu: empiiriline uuring kontrastiivse õppega', 'fi': 'Selityskaavion luominen esikoulutettujen kielimallien avulla: Empiirinen tutkimus kontrastiivisesta oppimisesta', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'גרמת גרף הסבר באמצעות מודלים לשפה מאומנים מראש: מחקר אימפריקלי עם לימוד נגד', 'sk': 'Oblikovanje grafičnih grafov prek predusposobljenih jezikovnih modelov: Empirična študija s kontrastivnim učenjem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Explanation Graph Generation via Pre-trained Language Models: An Empirical Study with Contrastive Learning'}
{'en': 'Transformers are unable to model long-term memories effectively, since the amount of computation they need to perform grows with the context length. While variations of efficient transformers have been proposed, they all have a finite memory capacity and are forced to drop old information. In this paper, we propose the \\infty-former, which extends the vanilla transformer with an unbounded long-term memory. By making use of a continuous-space attention mechanism to attend over the long-term memory, the \\infty-former’s attention complexity becomes independent of the context length, trading off memory length with precision.In order to control where precision is more important, \\infty-former maintains “sticky memories,” being able to model arbitrarily long contexts while keeping the computation budget fixed.Experiments on a synthetic sorting task, language modeling, and document grounded dialogue generation demonstrate the \\infty-former’s ability to retain information from long sequences.', 'ar': 'أدت نماذج لغة التسلسل إلى التسلسل المدربة مسبقًا إلى نجاح واسع النطاق في العديد من مهام إنشاء اللغة الطبيعية. ومع ذلك ، كان هناك عمل أقل نسبيًا في تحليل قدرتها على إنشاء مخرجات منظمة مثل الرسوم البيانية. على عكس اللغة الطبيعية ، فإن الرسوم البيانية لها خصائص هيكلية ودلالية مميزة في سياق مهمة معالجة اللغات الطبيعية ، على سبيل المثال ، يمكن أن يُعزى إنشاء رسم بياني متصل وغير دوري إلى قيودها الهيكلية ، بينما يمكن أن تشير دلالات الرسم البياني إلى مدى معنى تمثل الحافة العلاقة بين مفهومين للعقدة. في هذا العمل ، ندرس نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا التي تنشئ رسومًا بيانية توضيحية بطريقة شاملة ونحلل قدرتها على تعلم القيود الهيكلية ودلالات مثل هذه الرسوم البيانية. نوضح أولاً أنه مع الإشراف المحدود ، غالبًا ما تنشئ نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا رسومًا بيانية إما تنتهك هذه القيود أو تكون غير متماسكة لغويًا. نظرًا لأن تنظيم كمية كبيرة من الرسوم البيانية التي يشرحها الإنسان أمر مكلف ومضجر ، فإننا نقترح طرقًا بسيطة لكنها فعالة لاضطرابات الرسم البياني عبر عمليات تحرير العقدة والحافة التي تؤدي إلى رسوم بيانية إيجابية وسلبية هيكلية ومعنوية. بعد ذلك ، نستفيد من هذه الرسوم البيانية في نماذج تعلم متباينة مختلفة مع خسائر Max-Margin و InfoNCE. تؤدي أساليبنا إلى تحسينات كبيرة في كل من الدقة الهيكلية والدلالية للرسوم البيانية التوضيحية وأيضًا التعميم على مهام إنشاء الرسوم البيانية المماثلة الأخرى. أخيرًا ، نظهر ذلك\nالأخطاء البشرية هي أفضل السلبيات للتعلم التباين وأيضًا أن إنشاء المزيد من الرسوم البيانية السلبية الشبيهة بالبشر يمكن أن يؤدي تلقائيًا إلى مزيد من التحسينات.', 'ja': '事前に訓練されたシーケンスツーシーケンス言語モデルは、多くの自然言語生成タスクで広範囲に成功をもたらした。 しかしながら、グラフなどの構造化出力を生成する能力を分析する作業は比較的少なくなっている。 自然言語とは異なり、グラフは、下流ＮＬＰタスクの文脈において明確な構造的および意味的特性を有し、例えば、接続され、非巡回的であるグラフを生成することは、その構造的制約に起因することが可能であるが、一方で、グラフの意味論は、エッジが２つのノード概念間の関係をいかに有意義に表現するかを参照することができる。 この研究では、説明グラフをエンドツーエンドで生成する事前に訓練された言語モデルを研究し、そのようなグラフの構造的制約と意味論を学習する能力を分析します。 まず、限られた監督下では、事前に訓練された言語モデルは、これらの制約に違反するか、意味的に一貫性のないグラフを生成することが多いことを示します。 大量の人間が注釈したグラフをキュレーションすることは、高価で面倒なので、構造的にも意味的にもポジティブなグラフとネガティブなグラフにつながるノードとエッジの編集操作を介したグラフの摂動の簡単で効果的な方法を提案します。 次に、Max - MarginとInfoNCEの損失を持つさまざまな対照的な学習モデルでこれらのグラフを活用します。 私たちの方法は、説明グラフの構造的精度と意味的精度の両方の大幅な改善につながり、他の同様のグラフ生成タスクにも一般化します。最後に、\nヒューマンエラーは、対照的な学習のための最良のネガティブであり、また、そのようなヒューマンのようなネガティブなグラフを自動的に生成することは、さらなる改善につながる可能性があります。', 'es': 'Los modelos de lenguaje de secuencia a secuencia previamente entrenados han dado lugar a un éxito generalizado en muchas tareas de generación de lenguaje natural. Sin embargo, se ha trabajado relativamente menos en el análisis de su capacidad para generar resultados estructurados, como gráficos. A diferencia del lenguaje natural, los gráficos tienen propiedades estructurales y semánticas distintas en el contexto de una tarea de PNL posterior, por ejemplo, generar un gráfico que esté conectado y acíclico se puede atribuir a sus restricciones estructurales, mientras que la semántica de un gráfico puede referirse al significado que tiene un borde relación entre dos conceptos de nodos. En este trabajo, estudiamos modelos de lenguaje previamente entrenados que generan gráficos explicativos de manera integral y analizamos su capacidad para aprender las restricciones estructurales y la semántica de dichos gráficos. Primero demostramos que, con una supervisión limitada, los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados a menudo generan gráficos que violan estas restricciones o son semánticamente incoherentes. Dado que conservar una gran cantidad de gráficos con anotaciones humanas es caro y tedioso, proponemos formas simples pero efectivas de perturbaciones gráficas a través de operaciones de edición de nodos y bordes que conducen a gráficos positivos y negativos estructural y semánticamente. A continuación, aprovechamos estos gráficos en diferentes modelos de aprendizaje contrastivo con pérdidas de Max-Margin e InFonce. Nuestros métodos conducen a mejoras significativas en la precisión estructural y semántica de los gráficos explicativos y también se generalizan a otras tareas de generación de gráficos similares. Por último, demostramos que\nLos errores humanos son los mejores aspectos negativos para el aprendizaje contrastivo y también que la generación automática de más gráficos negativos similares a los humanos puede conducir a mejoras adicionales.', 'fr': "Les modèles de langage séquence-séquence pré-entraînés ont permis un succès généralisé dans de nombreuses tâches de génération de langage naturel. Cependant, il y a eu relativement moins de travail sur l'analyse de leur capacité à générer des résultats structurés tels que des graphiques. Contrairement au langage naturel, les graphes ont des propriétés structurelles et sémantiques distinctes dans le contexte d'une tâche NLP en aval, par exemple, la génération d'un graphe qui est connecté et acyclique peut être attribuée à ses contraintes structurelles, tandis que la sémantique d'un graphe peut faire référence à la signification d'un bord relation entre deux concepts de nœuds. Dans ce travail, nous étudions des modèles de langage pré-entraînés qui génèrent des graphiques d'explication de bout en bout et analysons leur capacité à apprendre les contraintes structurelles et la sémantique de tels graphiques. Nous montrons d'abord qu'avec une supervision limitée, les modèles de langage préformés génèrent souvent des graphiques qui violent ces contraintes ou sont sémantiquement incohérents. Étant donné que la conservation d'un grand nombre de graphes annotés par l'homme est coûteuse et fastidieuse, nous proposons des méthodes simples mais efficaces de perturbation des graphes via des opérations d'édition de nœuds et de bords qui conduisent à des graphiques positifs et négatifs structurellement et sémantiquement. Ensuite, nous exploitons ces graphiques dans différents modèles d'apprentissage contrastifs avec les pertes Max-Margin et InFonce. Nos méthodes conduisent à des améliorations significatives de la précision structurelle et sémantique des graphes d'explication et se généralisent également à d'autres tâches similaires de génération de graphes. Enfin, nous montrons que\nles erreurs humaines sont les meilleurs points négatifs pour l'apprentissage contrastif et la génération automatique de graphiques négatifs similaires à ceux de l'homme peut conduire à de nouvelles améliorations.", 'zh': '豫序至序,形于众自然语言。 然析其结构化输(如图)之能,事相薄也。 与自然语言不同,图在下流NLP上下文有异构语义性,如生成连属,非循环之图可归因于约束,而图语义可指边两节点之间。 于是考端训语,析其约束语义能。 先明于有限之监,预训之言,常生违制,语义不连贯之图。 因大注图形昂贵乏味,故建节点边编辑操作简易之效,以致构语义之正图负图。 继之以大保证金与 InfoNCE 之所损,比之以图。 吾道著于解图之构语义准确性,而推及他图之成务。 最后,我们明白\n人之为非,比学之至负面,而自生多类人之负面图可得而进也。', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem de sequência a sequência pré-treinados levaram a um sucesso generalizado em muitas tarefas de geração de linguagem natural. No entanto, tem havido relativamente menos trabalho na análise de sua capacidade de gerar resultados estruturados, como gráficos. Ao contrário da linguagem natural, os grafos têm propriedades estruturais e semânticas distintas no contexto de uma tarefa de PNL a jusante, por exemplo, gerar um grafo que é conectado e acíclico pode ser atribuído a suas restrições estruturais, enquanto a semântica de um grafo pode se referir a quão significativamente um aresta representa a relação entre dois conceitos de nós. Neste trabalho, estudamos modelos de linguagem pré-treinados que geram grafos de explicação de maneira ponta a ponta e analisamos sua capacidade de aprender as restrições estruturais e semânticas de tais grafos. Primeiro, mostramos que, com supervisão limitada, modelos de linguagem pré-treinados geralmente geram grafos que violam essas restrições ou são semanticamente incoerentes. Como a curadoria de uma grande quantidade de gráficos anotados por humanos é cara e tediosa, propomos maneiras simples, mas eficazes de perturbações de gráficos por meio de operações de edição de nó e borda que levam a gráficos positivos e negativos estrutural e semanticamente. Em seguida, aproveitamos esses gráficos em diferentes modelos de aprendizagem contrastiva com perdas Max-Margin e InfoNCE. Nossos métodos levam a melhorias significativas na precisão estrutural e semântica dos gráficos de explicação e também generalizam para outras tarefas semelhantes de geração de gráficos. Por último, mostramos que\nos erros humanos são os melhores negativos para a aprendizagem contrastiva e também que a geração automática de mais gráficos negativos semelhantes a humanos pode levar a melhorias adicionais.', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम भाषा मॉडल ने कई प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी के कार्यों में व्यापक सफलता का नेतृत्व किया है। हालांकि, ग्राफ़ जैसे संरचित आउटपुट उत्पन्न करने की उनकी क्षमता का विश्लेषण करने पर अपेक्षाकृत कम काम किया गया है। प्राकृतिक भाषा के विपरीत, ग्राफ़ में डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलपी कार्य के संदर्भ में अलग-अलग संरचनात्मक और शब्दार्थ गुण होते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, एक ग्राफ उत्पन्न करना जो जुड़ा हुआ है और एसाइक्लिक को इसकी संरचनात्मक बाधाओं के लिए जिम्मेदार ठहराया जा सकता है, जबकि ग्राफ के शब्दार्थ इस बात का उल्लेख कर सकते हैं कि एक किनारे दो नोड अवधारणाओं के बीच संबंध का कितना सार्थक रूप से प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। इस काम में, हम पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल का अध्ययन करते हैं जो अंत-से-अंत तरीके से स्पष्टीकरण ग्राफ उत्पन्न करते हैं और इस तरह के ग्राफ़ की संरचनात्मक बाधाओं और शब्दार्थ को सीखने की उनकी क्षमता का विश्लेषण करते हैं। हम पहले दिखाते हैं कि सीमित पर्यवेक्षण के साथ, पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल अक्सर ग्राफ उत्पन्न करते हैं जो या तो इन बाधाओं का उल्लंघन करते हैं या शब्दार्थ रूप से असंगत होते हैं। चूंकि मानव-एनोटेटेड ग्राफ़ की बड़ी मात्रा को क्यूरेट करना महंगा और थकाऊ है, इसलिए हम नोड और एज एडिट ऑपरेशन के माध्यम से ग्राफ़ के सरल अभी तक प्रभावी तरीकों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो संरचनात्मक और शब्दार्थ रूप से सकारात्मक और नकारात्मक ग्राफ़ का नेतृत्व करते हैं। अगला, हम मैक्स-मार्जिन और इंफोएनसीई नुकसान के साथ विभिन्न कंट्रास्टिव लर्निंग मॉडल में इन ग्राफ़ों का लाभ उठाते हैं। हमारे तरीके स्पष्टीकरण ग्राफ़ की संरचनात्मक और शब्दार्थ सटीकता दोनों में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार करते हैं और अन्य समान ग्राफ पीढ़ी के कार्यों के लिए भी सामान्यीकृत करते हैं। अंत में, हम दिखाते हैं कि\nमानव त्रुटियां contrastive सीखने के लिए सबसे अच्छा नकारात्मक हैं और यह भी कि स्वचालित रूप से अधिक मानव-जैसे नकारात्मक रेखांकन उत्पन्न करने से आगे सुधार हो सकता है।', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные языковые модели последовательности к последовательности привели к широкому успеху во многих задачах генерации естественного языка. Однако было проведено относительно меньше работы по анализу их способности генерировать структурированные результаты, такие как графики. В отличие от естественного языка, графы имеют различные структурные и семантические свойства в контексте задачи NLP ниже по потоку, например, генерация графа, который соединен и ацикличен, может быть отнесена к его структурным ограничениям, в то время как семантика графа может относиться к тому, насколько значимо ребро представляет связь между двумя концепциями узлов. В этой работе мы изучаем предварительно обученные языковые модели, которые генерируют графы объяснения сквозным образом и анализируют их способность изучать структурные ограничения и семантику таких графов. Сначала мы показываем, что при ограниченном надзоре, предварительно обученные языковые модели часто генерируют графики, которые либо нарушают эти ограничения, либо являются семантически некогерентными. Поскольку курирование большого количества аннотированных человеком графов является дорогостоящим и утомительным, мы предлагаем простые, но эффективные способы возмущений графа через операции редактирования узлов и ребер, которые приводят к структурно и семантически положительным и отрицательным графам. Далее мы используем эти графики в различных контрастных моделях обучения с Max-Margin и InfoNCE убытками. Наши методы приводят к значительному улучшению как структурной, так и семантической точности графов объяснения, а также обобщают другие подобные задачи построения графов. Наконец, мы показываем, что\nошибки человека являются лучшими негативами для контрастного обучения, а также то, что автоматическое генерирование большего количества таких человекоподобных негативных графиков может привести к дальнейшим улучшениям.', 'ga': 'Mar thoradh ar mhúnlaí teanga seicheamh-go-seicheamh réamhoilte tá rath forleathan ar go leor tascanna giniúna teanga nádúrtha. Mar sin féin, is lú go mór an obair a rinneadh ar anailís a dhéanamh ar a gcumas aschuir struchtúrtha ar nós graif a ghiniúint. Murab ionann agus teanga nádúrtha, tá airíonna struchtúracha agus shéimeantacha ar leith ag graif i gcomhthéacs tasc NLP le sruth, m.sh. is féidir graf a ghiniúint atá nasctha agus aicthimthriallach a chur i leith a srianta struchtúracha, agus is féidir le séimeantaic graf tagairt a dhéanamh do cé chomh brí agus is féidir. Léiríonn imeall an gaol idir dhá choincheap nód. Sa saothar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte a ghineann graif mhínithe ar bhealach ceann go ceann agus a dhéanann anailís ar a gcumas srianta struchtúracha agus séimeantaice graf dá leithéid a fhoghlaim. Léirímid ar dtús, faoi mhaoirseacht theoranta, gur minic a ghineann samhlacha teanga réamhoilte graif a sháraíonn na srianta sin nó a bhíonn neamhchomhleanúnach go séimeantach le maoirseacht theoranta. Ós rud é go bhfuil sé costasach agus tedious cuid mhór graf daonna-nótáilte a choimeád, molaimid bealaí simplí ach éifeachtacha chun graif a shuaiteadh trí oibríochtaí eagarthóireachta nód agus ciumhais as a dtagann graif deimhneacha agus diúltacha ó thaobh struchtúir agus séimeantaice de. Ansin, déanaimid na graif seo a ghiaráil i múnlaí foghlama codarsnacha éagsúla le caillteanais Max-Margin agus InfoNCE. Tagann feabhsuithe suntasacha ar chruinneas struchtúrach agus shéimeantach na ngraif mhínithe de bharr ár modhanna agus déantar ginearálú freisin ar thascanna giniúna grafa eile dá samhail. Ar deireadh, léirímid é sin\nis iad na hearráidí daonna na claonchlónna is fearr le haghaidh foghlama codarsnachta agus freisin má ghintear go huathoibríoch níos mó graif dhiúltacha den sórt sin atá cosúil leis an duine is féidir tuilleadh feabhsuithe a dhéanamh.', 'it': "Modelli linguistici pre-formati sequenza-sequenza hanno portato a un successo diffuso in molte attività di generazione del linguaggio naturale. Tuttavia, c'è stato relativamente meno lavoro sull'analisi della loro capacità di generare output strutturati come grafici. A differenza del linguaggio naturale, i grafici hanno proprietà strutturali e semantiche distinte nel contesto di un'attività NLP a valle, ad esempio generando un grafico collegato e aciclico può essere attribuito ai suoi vincoli strutturali, mentre la semantica di un grafico può riferirsi a come significativamente un bordo rappresenti la relazione tra due concetti di nodo. In questo lavoro studiamo modelli linguistici pre-formati che generano grafici esplicativi in modo end-to-end e analizziamo la loro capacità di apprendere i vincoli strutturali e la semantica di tali grafici. Mostriamo innanzitutto che con una supervisione limitata, i modelli linguistici pre-addestrati spesso generano grafici che violano questi vincoli o sono semanticamente incoerenti. Poiché curare una grande quantità di grafici annotati dall'uomo è costoso e noioso, proponiamo modi semplici ma efficaci di perturbazioni del grafico tramite operazioni di modifica dei nodi e dei bordi che portano a grafici strutturalmente e semanticamente positivi e negativi. Successivamente, sfruttiamo questi grafici in diversi modelli di apprendimento contrastante con perdite Max-Margin e InfoNCE. I nostri metodi portano a miglioramenti significativi sia nella precisione strutturale che semantica dei grafici esplicativi e si generalizzano anche ad altri compiti simili di generazione dei grafici. Infine, dimostriamo che\nGli errori umani sono i migliori negativi per l'apprendimento contrastante e anche che generare automaticamente più grafici negativi simili a quelli umani può portare a ulteriori miglioramenti.", 'hu': 'Az előkészített szekvencia-szekvencia nyelvi modellek széles körű sikerhez vezettek számos természetes nyelv generálási feladatban. Viszonylag kevesebb munka történt azonban a strukturált kimenetek, például grafikonok előállítására való képességük elemzésével. A természetes nyelvtől eltérően a grafikonok különböző strukturális és szemantikai tulajdonságokkal rendelkeznek egy downstream NLP feladat kontextusában, például egy összekapcsolt és aciklikus gráfot lehet tulajdonítani a strukturális korlátozásoknak, míg egy grafikon szemantikája arra utalhat, hogy egy él mennyire jelentősen képviseli a két csomópontfogalom közötti kapcsolatot. Ebben a munkában olyan előre képzett nyelvi modelleket tanulmányozunk, amelyek magyarázat grafikonokat generálnak végtől végig, és elemezzük azok képességét, hogy megtanulják az ilyen grafikonok strukturális korlátait és szemantikáját. Először is megmutatjuk, hogy korlátozott felügyelet mellett az előkészített nyelvi modellek gyakran olyan grafikonokat generálnak, amelyek vagy megsértik ezeket a korlátozásokat, vagy szemantikailag inkoherensek. Mivel nagy mennyiségű emberi jegyzetekkel ellátott grafikonok kurátora drága és unalmas, egyszerű, mégis hatékony módszereket javasolunk a gráf perturbációinak csomópont- és élszerkesztési műveletekkel, amelyek strukturálisan és szemantikusan pozitív és negatív grafikonokhoz vezetnek. Ezután ezeket a grafikonokat különböző kontrasztos tanulási modellekben használjuk fel Max-Margin és InfoNCE veszteségekkel. Módszereink jelentős javulást eredményeznek a magyarázási grafikonok strukturális és szemantikai pontosságában, valamint általánosítják más hasonló grafikongenerációs feladatokat is. Végül megmutatjuk, hogy\nAz emberi hibák a legjobb negatívumok a kontrasztos tanuláshoz, valamint az, hogy több ilyen emberszerű negatív grafikon automatikus generálása további fejlődéshez vezethet.', 'ka': 'პირველი განსწავლებული სისტემა-დან-სკენესური ენის მოდელები გავამუშავებენ ბევრი ნაირადი ენის წარმოდგენის მუშაობაში წარმოდგენა. მაგრამ არსებობს პარამეტრებით უფრო მეტი სამუშაო, როგორც გრაფიკები. ნაირადი ენაზე განსხვავებული სტრუქტური და სმენტიკური განსაზღვრებები NLP დავალების კონტექსტში, მაგალითად, დაკავშირებული და აციკლიკური გრაფიკას შესაძლებელია მისი სტრუქტური ზომილებისთვის ატრიბუტირება, მაგრამ გრაფიკას სმენტიკები შეუძლია გან ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ წინ შესწავლობული ენის მოდელები, რომლებიც საბოლოო დასასრულებელი გრაფიკების განახსნა და გავაანალიზოთ ისინი შესაძლებლობა, რომ ასეთი გრაფიკის სტრუქტურ პირველად ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ უფრო დარწმუნებული მოდელებით საუკეთესო ენის მოდელებით ზოგრაფიების შექმნა, რომელიც ან ეს დარწმუნებების შეცდომა ან ადამიანის ანოტირებული გრაფიკების დიდი ზომის კონტურაცია ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ეფექტიური გრაფიკის პერტუბურაციების გარეშე, რომლებიც სტრუქტურულად, სემონტიკურად შემდეგ, ჩვენ ეს გრაფიკები განსხვავებული კონტრასტური სწავლების მოდელში მაქსი-მარჯინი და InfoNCE-ის დასრულებებით გამოყენებთ. ჩვენი მეტოვები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სტრუქტურული და სენმანტიური წარმოდგენებაში და სხვა განსხვავებული გრაფიკის დამუშაობაში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია. საბოლოოდ ჩვენ ამას ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ\nადამიანის შეცდომები არის კონტრასტური სწავლებისთვის უკეთესი ნეგრატიგები და ასევე რომ ადამიანის უკეთესი ნეგრატური გრაფიკები შეიძლება ავტომატურად დავი', 'el': 'Τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία έχουν οδηγήσει σε ευρεία επιτυχία σε πολλές εργασίες δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, έχει γίνει σχετικά λιγότερη εργασία για την ανάλυση της ικανότητάς τους να παράγουν δομημένα αποτελέσματα όπως γραφήματα. Σε αντίθεση με τη φυσική γλώσσα, τα γραφήματα έχουν διακριτές δομικές και σημασιολογικές ιδιότητες στο πλαίσιο μιας μεταγενέστερης εργασίας π.χ., η δημιουργία ενός γραφήματος που είναι συνδεδεμένο και ακυκλικό μπορεί να αποδοθεί στους δομικούς περιορισμούς του, ενώ η σημασιολογία ενός γραφήματος μπορεί να αναφέρεται στο πόσο σημασιολογικά μια άκρη αντιπροσωπεύει τη σχέση μεταξύ δύο εννοιών κόμβων. Στην εργασία αυτή, μελετάμε προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα που παράγουν γραφήματα επεξήγησης με τρόπο τέλους και αναλύουμε την ικανότητά τους να μάθουν τους δομικούς περιορισμούς και τη σημασιολογία αυτών των γραφημάτων. Αρχικά δείχνουμε ότι με περιορισμένη εποπτεία, τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα συχνά δημιουργούν γραφήματα που είτε παραβιάζουν αυτούς τους περιορισμούς είτε είναι σημασιολογικά ασυνεχή. Δεδομένου ότι η επιμέλεια μεγάλου ποσού από ανθρώπους σχολιασμένων γραφημάτων είναι δαπανηρή και κουραστική, προτείνουμε απλούς αλλά αποτελεσματικούς τρόπους διαταραχών γραφημάτων μέσω διαδικασιών επεξεργασίας κόμβων και άκρων που οδηγούν σε δομικά και σημασιολογικά θετικά και αρνητικά γραφήματα. Στη συνέχεια, αξιοποιούμε αυτά τα γραφήματα σε διαφορετικά μοντέλα μάθησης με απώλειες μέγιστου περιθωρίου και InfoNCE. Οι μέθοδοι μας οδηγούν σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις τόσο στη δομική όσο και στη σημασιολογική ακρίβεια των γραφημάτων επεξήγησης και γενικεύουν σε άλλες παρόμοιες εργασίες δημιουργίας γραφημάτων. Τέλος, αποδεικνύουμε ότι\nΤα ανθρώπινα λάθη είναι τα καλύτερα αρνητικά για την αντίθετη μάθηση και επίσης ότι η αυτόματη δημιουργία περισσότερων τέτοιων ανθρώπινων αρνητικών γραφικών μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε περαιτέρω βελτιώσεις.', 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai iš eilės į eilę sukėlė didelę sėkmę daugelyje gamtos kalbų kūrimo užduočių. Tačiau atliktas palyginti mažiau darbų analizuojant jų gebėjimą sukurti struktūrizuotus rezultatus, pvz., grafikus. Skirtingai nuo natūralios kalbos, grafikai turi skirtingas struktūrines ir semantines savybes, susijusias su tolesnėmis NLP užduotimis, pvz., sujungto grafiko sukūrimas ir aciklinis grafikas gali būti priskiriamas jo struktūriniams apribojimams, o grafiko semantika gali nurodyti, kaip reikšmingai kraštas atspindi dviejų mazgų sąvokų santykį. Šiame darbe mes tiriame iš anksto parengtus kalbų modelius, kurie iš karto į galą sukuria paaiškinimų grafikus ir analizuoja jų gebėjimą mokytis tokių grafikų struktūrinių apribojimų ir semantikos. Pirmiausia rodome, kad ribota priežiūra iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai dažnai sukuria grafikus, kurie pažeidžia šiuos apribojimus arba yra semantiškai nesuderinami. Kadangi didelis žmogaus anotuotų grafikų kiekis yra brangus ir nuobodus, siūlome paprastus, bet veiksmingus grafikų perturbacijų būdus atliekant mazgų ir kraštų redagavimo operacijas, kurios lemia struktūrinius ir semantinius teigiamus ir neigiamus grafikus. Kita vertus, šiuos grafikus naudojame skirtingais kontrastiniais mokymosi modeliais su Max-Margin ir InfoNCE nuostoliais. Mūsų metodai labai pagerina aiškinamųjų grafikų struktūrinį ir semantinį tikslumą ir taip pat apskritai apima kitas panašias grafikų kūrimo užduotis. Galiausiai rodome, kad\nžmogaus klaidos yra geriausiai neigiamos kontrastiniam mokymuisi ir taip pat tai, kad automatiškai sukuriant daugiau tokių žmogui būdingų neigiamų grafikų gali būti toliau tobulinama.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa jujukan-ke-jujukan terlatih telah membawa ke kejayaan yang luas dalam banyak tugas generasi bahasa alam. Namun, terdapat relatif kurang kerja untuk menganalisis kemampuan mereka untuk menghasilkan output struktur seperti graf. Tidak seperti bahasa alam, graf mempunyai ciri-ciri struktur dan semantik yang berbeza dalam konteks tugas NLP turun, cth., menghasilkan graf yang disambungkan dan aksiklik boleh ditakrif kepada keterangan strukturnya, sementara semantik graf boleh rujuk kepada betapa berarti pinggir mewakili hubungan antara dua konsep nod. In this work, we study pre-trained language models that generate explanation graphs in an end-to-end manner and analyze their ability to learn the structural constraints and semantics of such graphs.  Kami pertama-tama menunjukkan bahawa dengan pengawasan terhad, model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih sering menghasilkan graf yang sama ada melanggar keterangan ini atau secara semantik tidak konsisten. Oleh kerana mengurus jumlah besar graf yang dicatat manusia adalah mahal dan membosankan, kami menyarankan cara sederhana tetapi efektif mengganggu graf melalui operasi edit nod dan pinggir yang membawa kepada graf struktur dan semantik positif dan negatif. Seterusnya, kita menggunakan graf ini dalam model pembelajaran bertentangan yang berbeza dengan kehilangan Max-Margin dan InfoNCE. Kaedah kami membawa kepada peningkatan yang signifikan dalam kedua-dua ketepatan struktur dan semantik graf penjelasan dan juga menyebarkan kepada tugas generasi graf yang sama lain. Akhirnya, kita tunjukkan bahawa\nralat manusia adalah negatif terbaik untuk pembelajaran kontras dan juga bahawa secara automatik menghasilkan lebih banyak graf negatif seperti manusia boleh membawa kepada peningkatan lanjut.', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқылған sequence- to- sequence тіл үлгілері бірнеше табиғи тілдерді құру тапсырмаларында жетілдіреді. Бірақ графиктер секілді құрылған шығыстарды жасау мүмкіндігін анализ ету үшін салыстырмалы жұмыс істеді. Табиғи тіліне сәйкес, графиктердің бағытталған NLP тапсырмасының бағытталған қасиеттері, мысалы, қосылған график жасау және акцикликалық график құрылған құрылғыларының құрылғы шектеріне атрибут мүмкін, графиктің семантикалығы екі түпнұсқалар арасындағы қатынасын қала Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз алдын- аяқталған тіл үлгілерін зерттеп, графиктерді аяқтау тәртібімен түсініктемелерді жасап, бұл графиктердің структуралық шектерін және семантикасын үйрену мүмкіндігін анализи Біз біріншіден шектелген бақылау үлгілерімен, алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілері көбінесе бұл шектеулерді шектеп, немесе семантикалық тәртіпсіздіктерді құрады. Адамдың белгіленген графиктерінің үлкен мөлшерлерін өзгерту үлкен және қатты, біз графиктердің қарапайым және эффективні түрлерін батырмалар мен шеттердің өңдеу операцияларының көмегімен құрылып, semantiкалық Келесіден, бұл графиктерді бағытты оқыту үлгілерінде максимумыз шегін және мәлімет NCE жоғалуымыз керек. Біздің әдістеріміз графиктердің структуралық және симантикалық түсініктердің дұрыстығын жақсы жасауға болады және басқа ұқсас графиктердің құру тапсырмаларына жалғастырад Соңында біз\nАдам қатесі - контрастық оқыту үшін ең жақсы негативті, сондай-ақ оның көптеген адамдардың негативті графиктерін автоматты түрде жасауға болады.', 'mk': 'Претренираните јазички модели од секвенца до секвенца доведоа до широк успех во многу природни задачи за генерација јазици. Сепак, има релативно помалку работа за анализирање на нивната способност да генерираат структурни излези како што се графиците. За разлика од природниот јазик, графиците имаат различни структурни и семантични сопствености во контекст на понатамошната задача на НЛП, на пример, генерирањето график кој е поврзан и акцикличен може да се припишува на своите структурни ограничувања, додека семантиката на графикот може да се однесува на тоа колку значително раб ја претставува односата пом Во оваа работа, ние студираме предобучени јазички модели кои генерираат објаснувачки графики на крај до крај и ги анализираме нивните способности да ги научат структурните ограничувања и семантика на ваквите графики. Прво покажуваме дека со ограничен надзор, предобучените јазички модели честопати генерираат графики кои или ги прекршуваат овие ограничувања или се семантички несогледни. Бидејќи лекувањето на голема количина графики кои се анотирани од човекот е скапо и досадно, предложуваме едноставни, но ефикасни начини на графички пертурбирања преку операции за уредување на јазлите и работите кои водат до структурно и семантично позитивни и негативни графики. Следно, ги користиме овие графики во различни контрастивни модели на учење со загуби на Макс-Маргин и ИнфоНЦЕ. Нашите методи водат до значителни подобрувања во структурната и семантичната точност на објаснувачките графики и, исто така, се генерализираат на други слични задачи на генерација на графики. Lastly, we show that\nчовечките грешки се најдобрите негативни за контрастивното учење и исто така, автоматски генерирање повеќе такви човечки негативни графики може да доведе до понатамошни подобрувања.', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ട്രെയിന്\u200dസ് ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d വളരെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ തലമുറകളില്\u200d വിജയം വി എങ്കിലും ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d പോലെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കഴിവുകള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് കുറച്ച് ജോലി ഉണ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയ്ക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായിട്ടും ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് താഴ്വരയിലെ NLP ജോലിയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ഗ്രാഫ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന് ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശീലന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അത് അവസാനത്തേക്ക് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനത്തേക്ക് അവസാ നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം കാണിക്കുന്നത് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനം നടത്തുന്ന ഭാഷ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും ഗ്രാ മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലപ്പെടുത്തിയ ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകള്\u200d വിലയേറെയും വിഷമവുമാണെന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നോഡില്\u200d നിന്നും മുകളില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകളുടെ പ്രവർത അടുത്ത്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗമായ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d വെച്ച് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മാക്സ്-മാ നമ്മുടെ രീതികള്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തിലും സെമാന്റിക്കിലും ഗ്രാഫുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണത്തിലും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dഗണന മാര്\u200d അവസാനം, നമുക്ക് കാണിച്ചു തരാം.\nമനുഷ്യരുടെ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്പുള്ള വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച നെഗറിവേറ്റിവുകളാണ്. ഇത്തരം മനുഷ്യരെപ്പോലെയുള്', 'mt': 'Mudelli lingwistiċi ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza mħarrġa minn qabel wasslu għal suċċess mifrux f’ħafna kompiti ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ lingwi naturali. Madankollu, kien hemm relattivament inqas xogħol fuq l-analiżi tal-kapaċità tagħhom li jiġġeneraw riżultati strutturati bħal grafiċi. Għall-kuntrarju tal-lingwa naturali, il-grafiċi g ħandhom proprjetajiet strutturali u semantiċi distinti fil-kuntest ta’ kompitu downstream NLP, pereżempju, il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ grafika li hija konnessa u a ċiklika tista’ tiġi attribwita għar-restrizzjonijiet strutturali tagħha, filwaqt li s-semantika ta’ grafika tista’ tirreferi għal kemm b’mod sinifikanti xifer jirrappreżenta r-relazzjoni bejn żewġ kunċetti ta’ nodi. F’dan ix-xogħol, nistudjaw mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel li jiġġeneraw grafiċi ta’ spjegazzjoni b’mod minn tarf għal tarf u tanalizzaw il-kapaċità tagħhom li jitgħallmu r-restrizzjonijiet strutturali u s-semantika ta’ dawn il-grafiċi. We first show that with limited supervision, pre-trained language models often generate graphs that either violate these constraints or are semantically incoherent.  Peress li l-kura ta’ ammont kbir ta’ graffi annotati mill-bniedem hija għalja u tedjuża, qed nipproponu modi sempliċi iżda effettivi ta’ perturbazzjonijiet tal-graffi permezz ta’ operazzjonijiet ta’ editjar tan-nodi u tat-tarf li jwasslu għal graffi strutturalment u semantikament pożittivi u negattivi. Imbagħad, aħna ninfurzaw dawn il-grafiċi f’mudelli differenti ta’ tagħlim kuntrastwali mat-telf ta’ Max-Margin u InfoNCE. Il-metodi tagħna jwasslu għal titjib sinifikanti kemm fil-preċiżjoni strutturali kif ukoll semantika tal-graffi ta’ spjegazzjoni u jiġġeneralizzaw ukoll għal kompiti simili oħra ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ graffi. Fl-aħħar nett, nuru li\nl-iżbalji umani huma l-aħjar negattivi għat-tagħlim kuntrastiv u wkoll li l-ġenerazzjoni awtomatika ta’ aktar grafiki negattivi bħal dawk tal-bniedem tista’ twassal għal aktar titjib.', 'no': 'Førehandsvisa språk-til-sekvens-modeller har ført til utbreidde suksess i mange naturlege språk-oppgåver. Det er imidlertid relativt mindre arbeid på å analysera dei mulighetene til å laga strukturerte utdata, som graf. I motsetjing av naturspråk har grafen ulike strukturære og semantiske eigenskapar i konteksten av e in nedstrøm NLP-oppgåve, f.eks. oppretting av eit graf som er kopla til og akusiklisk kan attributtast til strukturbegrensningar sine, mens semantikkane av eit graf kan referere til korleis ein kant betydelag representerer forholdet mellom to nodekonseptar. I denne arbeiden studerer vi føretrainerte språk-modeller som lagar utklaringsgrafen på ein slutt-til-slutt måte og analyserer dei mulighetene til å lære strukturelle begrensningar og semantikk av slike grafen. Vi viser først at med begrenset overvåking, først trengte språk-modeller genererer ofte grafikk som enten violerer desse begrensene eller er semantisk inkoherende. Sidan det kjenner store menneskelige notasjonsgrafikk er dykka og bort, fører vi enkle, men effektiv måtar å gjere grafen gjennom node og kantredigeringsoperasjonar som fører til strukturelle og semantisk positive og negative grafen. Neste leverer vi desse grafene i ulike kontrastiske læringsmodeller med tap av maksimum Margin og InfoNCE. Metodane våre fører til signifikante forbedringar i både strukturelle og semantiske nøyaktighet for forklaringar og generelliserer også til andre liknande grafiske oppgåver. I slutt viser vi at\nmenneskelige feil er dei beste negativane for kontrastlæring, og også at automatisk oppretting av meir slike menneskelige negativ grafen kan føre til meir forbedringar.', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe sekwencji-sekwencji doprowadziły do powszechnego sukcesu w wielu zadaniach generowania języka naturalnego. Jednakże stosunkowo mniej pracy nad analizą ich zdolności do generowania ustrukturyzowanych wyników, takich jak wykresy. W przeciwieństwie do języka naturalnego, wykresy mają odrębne właściwości strukturalne i semantyczne w kontekście dalszego zadania NLP, np. generowanie wykresu, który jest połączony i acykliczny można przypisać jego ograniczeniom strukturalnym, natomiast semantyka wykresu może odnosić się do tego, jak znacząco krawędzia reprezentuje relację między dwoma koncepcjami węzłów. W niniejszej pracy badamy wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe generujące wykresy wyjaśniające w sposób end-to-end oraz analizujemy ich zdolność do poznania ograniczeń strukturalnych i semantyki takich wykresów. Po pierwsze pokazujemy, że przy ograniczonym nadzorze, wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe często generują wykresy, które albo naruszają te ograniczenia, albo są niespójne semantycznie. Ponieważ kuracja dużej ilości wykresów z adnotacjami człowieka jest kosztowna i uciążliwa, proponujemy proste, ale skuteczne sposoby zakłóceń wykresów poprzez operacje edycji węzłów i krawędzi, które prowadzą do strukturalnie i semantycznie pozytywnych i ujemnych wykresów. Następnie wykorzystujemy te wykresy w różnych kontrastywnych modelach uczenia się z stratami Max-Margin i InfoNCE. Nasze metody prowadzą do znaczącej poprawy dokładności strukturalnej i semantycznej wykresów wyjaśniających, a także uogólniają do innych podobnych zadań generowania wykresów. Na koniec pokazujemy, że\nBłędy ludzkie są najlepszymi negatywami dla kontrastywnego uczenia się, a także to, że automatyczne generowanie więcej takich negatywnych wykresów może prowadzić do dalszych ulepszeń.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын дарааллаас дарааллаар хэл загварууд нь байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний ажил дээр амжилтыг ихэвчлэн өргөн болгосон. Гэхдээ график шиг бүтээгдэхүүний үр дүн гаргах чадварыг шинжилгээнд харьцангуй бага ажил байгаа. Байгалийн хэл шиг харьцаа, график нь доорх NLP үйл ажиллагааны тухай өөр өөр бүтэц болон semantic өөрчлөлт байдаг. Жишээлбэл, холбогдсон график болон циклик график үүсгэх нь түүний бүтэц хязгаартай байх боломжтой. Графикийн semantics нь хэр утгатай тал нь хоёр цуглуудын хоорондын харилцааны Энэ ажлын хувьд бид өмнө сургалтын хэл загваруудыг судалж, төгсгөлд нь тодорхойлолтой график бий болгож, ийм графикийн бүтэц хязгаарлалтыг, semantics сурах чадварыг шинжилдэг. Эхлээд бид хязгаарлагдсан хязгаарлагдсан хэл загваруудын хувьд ихэвчлэн эдгээр хязгаарлалуудыг буруутгах, эсвэл ихэвчлэн өөрчлөгдсөн график бий болгодог. Хүн төрөлхтний анзаарагдсан график их хэмжээний урам зориулах нь үнэтэй болон сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй учраас бид график хөндлөл болон хасах график график руу шилжүүлэх энгийн үр дүнтэй арга замыг сануулдаг. Дараа нь бид эдгээр графиктуудыг Макс-Маргин болон Мэдээллийн НҮБ-ийн алдагдалтай өөр өөр өөр аргаар суралцах загваруудыг ашиглаж байна. Бидний арга зам нь бүтэц болон semantic тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолт болон өөр төстэй график үеийн даалгавруудыг ихэвчлэн сайжруулдаг. Эцэст нь бид\nХүний алдаа бол эсрэг суралцах хамгийн сайн сөрөг нөлөө, мөн адилхан хүн шиг сөрөг графикийг автоматаар бий болгодог.', 'so': 'Tusaalooyinka luuqada ee hore-tababarida-soo-barashada waxaa sabab u noqday liibaano ballaadhan oo ku saabsan shaqooyin badan oo afka kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa jirtay shuqul ka yar oo ku sameynta awooddooda u sameynta soo saaritaanka rasmiga sida sawirro oo kale. Luqada asalka ah oo kala duwan waxaa ku qoran qaab dhismo iyo semanti oo kala duduwan goobta shaqada hoose e e NLP, tusaale ahaan dhaqdhaqaaq la xiriiro oo ku xiran karo oo waxaa loo dhigi karaa xadhiidka dhismaha, isla markaasna waxaa loola jeedi karaa siduu dhinaca ugu jeedo xiriirka labada fikir ee node ah. Shuqulkaas waxaynu ku baranaynaa modelalka afka hore oo lagu tababaray, kaasoo soo saara fasirada ugu dhammaadka ugu dhammaadka iyo baaritaanka awoodooda barashada qasabka dhismaha iyo sawirada sawirada. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu tusnaynaa in tusaalaha afka hore lagu tababaray ay marar badan dhashaan maamul ay jebiyaan xadgudubyadan ama ay si kamid ah u baahan yihiin. Sida darteed curbinta kartooyinka aad u badan ee dadka waa qaali iyo cabsi badan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa wadooyin fudud oo sahlan oo faa’iido ah oo ku saabsan kartooyinka kartooyinka ee ku saabsan sawir iyo edge-edge, taasoo ku hoggaamiya dhismo iyo hab-dhismo iyo wax-positive iyo negative. Next, we leverage these graphs in different contrastive learning models with Max-Margin and InfoNCE losses.  Dhaqdhaheenna waxay ku hoggaamiyaan hagaajinta aad u weyn dhismaha iyo saxda sawirada sawirida ah iyo sidoo kale waxay ku sameyn karaan shaqooyin kale oo la mid ah xarunta. ugu dambeyso waxan tusaynaa\ncilmiga biniaadamka waa kuwa ugu wanaagsan waxbarashada kala duwan, sidoo kale waxaa horumarin kara horumarinta u eg dadka.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite secvență-la-secvență au condus la succes pe scară largă în multe sarcini de generare a limbajului natural. Cu toate acestea, s-a lucrat relativ mai puțin la analiza capacității lor de a genera rezultate structurate, cum ar fi graficele. Spre deosebire de limbajul natural, graficele au proprietăți structurale și semantice distincte în contextul unei activități PNL din aval, de exemplu, generarea unui grafic conectat și aciclic poate fi atribuit constrângerilor sale structurale, în timp ce semantica unui grafic se poate referi la modul în care semnificativ o margine reprezintă relația dintre două concepte de nod. În această lucrare, studiem modele lingvistice pre-instruite care generează grafice de explicații într-un mod end-to-end și analizăm capacitatea lor de a învăța constrângerile structurale și semantica unor astfel de grafice. Mai întâi arătăm că, cu supraveghere limitată, modelele lingvistice pre-instruite generează adesea grafice care fie încalcă aceste constrângeri, fie sunt incoerente semantic. Deoarece curatarea unor cantități mari de grafice adnotate de om este costisitoare și plictisitoare, propunem modalități simple și eficiente de perturbare a graficului prin intermediul operațiunilor de editare a nodurilor și marginilor care duc la grafice pozitive și negative din punct de vedere structural și semantic. Apoi, valorificăm aceste grafice în diferite modele de învățare contrastante cu pierderi Max-Margin și InfoNCE. Metodele noastre duc la îmbunătățiri semnificative atât în acuratețea structurală, cât și semantică a graficelor de explicație și, de asemenea, generalizează la alte sarcini similare de generare a graficelor. În cele din urmă, arătăm că\nErorile umane sunt cele mai bune negative pentru învățarea contrastantă și, de asemenea, faptul că generarea automată a mai multor astfel de grafice negative asemănătoare omului poate duce la îmbunătățiri suplimentare.', 'sr': 'Pre-obučeni jezički modeli u sekvenci doveli su do širokog uspeha u mnogim zadacima generacije prirodnog jezika. Međutim, bilo je relativno manje posla na analiziranju njihove sposobnosti da stvore strukturirane ishode poput grafika. Za razliku od prirodnog jezika, grafike imaju različite strukturne i semantičke vlasništvo u kontekstu sledeće g zadatka NLP-a, npr. stvaranje grafa koji je povezan i akciklički može biti pripisano njegovim strukturnim ograničenjima, dok semantika grafa može referirati na to kako značajno granica predstavlja odnos između dva koncepta čvorova. U ovom poslu, proučavamo predobučene jezičke modele koji stvaraju grafike objašnjavanja na kraju i analiziraju njihovu sposobnost naučiti strukturne ograničenja i semantike takvih grafika. Prvo pokazujemo da sa ograničenim nadzorom, predobučenim jezičkim modelima često proizvode grafike koje ili krše te ograničenja ili su semantički nepoherene. Budući da je ciljanje velike količine ljudskih annotiranih grafika skupo i dosadno, predlažemo jednostavne, ali efikasne načine perturbacije grafika preko čvorova i graničnih edicionalnih operacija koje vode do strukturnih, semantički pozitivnih i negativnih grafika. Sledeće, uključujemo ove grafike u različite kontrastivne modele učenja sa gubitkama Maks-Margina i InfoNCE-a. Naše metode vode do značajnih poboljšanja i strukturne i semantičke tačnosti grafika objašnjavanja i generalizuju i druge slične zadatke generacije grafa. Na kraju, pokažemo to\nLjudske greške su najbolje negativne za kontrastivno učenje, a takođe da automatski proizvedenje takvih negativnih grafika poput ljudi može dovesti do daljnjih poboljšanja.', 'si': 'මුලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරධානයක් සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරධාන නමුත්, ඔවුන්ගේ විශ්ලේෂණ කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න සම්බන්ධයෙන් අඩු වැඩක් තියෙනවා වගේ සංස්ථ අනිවාර්ය භාෂාවක්, Graphs have Distinct Struktural and semantic Fearts in the Contexts of a downtream NLP job, e.g., genering a Graph that is tied and acbicic can be characted to its Struktural Restraints, whilst the semantics of a Graph can reference to How mean ingfully an Edge presents the bond of Two node Conscripts. මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ අවසානයෙන් අවසාන විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සිද්ධා කරනවා ඒ වගේම අන්තිම විදියට අව අපි මුලින්ම පෙන්වන්නේ සීමාවිත ප්\u200dරධානය, ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල්ස් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා ම ඉතින් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් ග්\u200dරාෆ්ට් වලට ග්\u200dරාෆ්ට් විශේෂය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණ විදියට අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා  ඊළඟට, අපි මේ ග්\u200dරාෆ්ට් එක්ක වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිදේශ විදිහට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ InfoNCE නැතිවෙනවා. අපේ විධානය ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාසය සහ සැමැන්තික විශ්වාසය ග්\u200dරාෆික් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනව අන්තිමට, අපි ඒක පෙන්වන්නම්\nමිනිස්සු වැරැද්දක් තමයි ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ඉගෙනීම සඳහා හොඳම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වැරැද්දක් වගේ මිනිස්සු වග', 'sv': 'Förutbildade sekvens-till-sekvens språkmodeller har lett till utbredd framgång i många naturliga språkgenereringsuppgifter. Dock har det varit relativt mindre arbete med att analysera deras förmåga att generera strukturerade utgångar såsom grafer. Till skillnad från naturligt språk har grafer distinkta strukturella och semantiska egenskaper i samband med en nedströms NLP-uppgift, t.ex. att generera en graf som är ansluten och acyklisk kan tillskrivas dess strukturella begränsningar, medan semantiken i en graf kan hänvisa till hur meningsfullt en kant representerar förhållandet mellan två nodbegrepp. I detta arbete studerar vi färdigutbildade språkmodeller som genererar förklaringsgrafer på ett end-to-end sätt och analyserar deras förmåga att lära sig strukturella begränsningar och semantik av sådana grafer. Vi visar först att med begränsad handledning genererar förkunskaperade språkmodeller ofta grafer som antingen bryter mot dessa begränsningar eller är semantiskt inkonsekventa. Eftersom det är dyrt och tråkigt att kurera stora mängder mänskliga-kommenterade grafer föreslår vi enkla men effektiva sätt för grafstörningar via nod- och kantredigeringsåtgärder som leder till strukturellt och semantiskt positiva och negativa grafer. Därefter utnyttjar vi dessa grafer i olika kontrastiva inlärningsmodeller med Max-Margin och InfoNCE förluster. Våra metoder leder till betydande förbättringar i både strukturell och semantisk noggrannhet av förklaringsgrafer och generaliserar även till andra liknande grafgenereringsuppgifter. Slutligen visar vi att\nmänskliga fel är det bästa negativa för kontrasterande lärande och också att automatiskt generera fler sådana mänskliga liknande negativa grafer kan leda till ytterligare förbättringar.', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்ச்சி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகள் பல இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கும் பணிகளில் வெற்றியடைந்தது. ஆயினும், வரைப்படங்கள் போன்ற உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வெளியீடுகளை ஆராய்ச்சியில் சிறிய வேலை ஏற்பட்டுள்ளது. இயல்பான மொழியை வித்தியாசமான வடிவமைப்பு மற்றும் semantic பண்புகளில் வரைபடங்கள் வேறுபாடு உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, உ. ம். ஒரு வரைபடத்தை இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் acyclic அதன் கட்டுப்பாட்டு கட்டுப்பாடுகளுக்கு க இந்த வேலையில், நாம் முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளை கற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம். அது விளக்கம் வரைபடங்களை முடிவு முறையாக உருவாக்குகிறது மற்றும் அவை வரை நாம் முதலில் உள்ள கண்காணிப்புடன், முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் பெரும்பாலும் வரைபடங்களை உருவாக்குகிறது அல்லது இந்த தடுப்புகளை  பெரிய குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட வரைபடங்களை பரிசோதிக்கும் போது விலையானது மற்றும் பயங்கரமானது, நாம் சுலபமான மற்றும் விளிம்பு திருத்தும் வழிகளை வரைபடத்தின் மூலம் செயல அடுத்து, நாம் இந்த வரைபடங்களை வெவ்வேறு வித்தியாசமான கற்றல் மாதிரிகளில் கொடுக்கிறோம் அதிக மார்ஜின் மற்றும் தகவல Our methods lead to significant improvements in both structural and semantic accuracy of explanation graphs and also generalize to other similar graph generation tasks.  கடைசியாக, நாம் அதை காட்டுகிறோம்\nமனித பிழைகள் எதிர்மறையான கல்வி கற்றுக்கான சிறந்த எதிர்மங்கள் ஆகும் மற்றும் தானாகவே மனிதன் போன்ற எதிர்மம் வரைபடங்களை உருவாக்கு', 'ur': 'پہلے کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کی زبان کی مدل نے بہت سی طبیعی زبان کی نسل کے کاموں میں کامیابی وسیع کر دی ہے۔ However, there is relatively less work on analyzing their ability to generate structured outputs such as graphs. طبیعی زبان کے بغیر، گراف کے لئے مختلف ساختاری اور سیمانٹی خصوصے NLP کے کام میں ہیں، جیسے ایک گراف پیدا کرنا ہے جو اس کے ساختاری محدودیت کے ساتھ ہے، حالانکہ ایک گراف کی سیمانٹیکوں کو بتائی جاتی ہے کہ ایک کنارہ کس مطلوب سے دو نوڈ معلومات کے درمیان رابطہ کی تعریف کرتا ہے. اس کام میں ہم پہلے تدریس کی زبان نمونڈل کی تعلیم کرتے ہیں جو آخر تک پڑھنے کے طریقے گراف کی تفصیل پیدا کرتی ہیں اور ان کی قابلیت تحلیل کرتی ہیں کہ ایسے گراف کے ساختاری محدودیت اور سیمانٹیک کو سکھائیں۔ ہم پہلے دکھاتے ہیں کہ محدود تحقیق کے ذریعہ، پہلے تحقیق کی زبان کی مدلکوں کے ساتھ کثرت سے گراف پیدا کرتی ہیں جو یہ محدودیتوں کو توڑ دیتے ہیں یا ان کے سامنے غلط ہیں۔ انسان کی بہت سی اندازے کے اظہار کرنے کے بعد ہم نے نوڈ اور کنارے کے اظہار کے ذریعے گراف کا سادہ اور مضبوط طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جو ساختہ اور سیمنٹی مثبت اور منفی گراف کی طرف لاتے ہیں۔ بعد، ہم ان گرافیکوں کو مختلف مختلف سیکھنے کی مدل میں مکس-مارجین اور InfoNCE خسارہ کے ساتھ لکھ دیتے ہیں. ہمارے طریقے فریقوں کی تعریف کے ساختہ اور سیمانٹی دقیقیت میں بہت اضافہ کرتے ہیں اور دوسری طرح طرح کے گراف پیدا کرنے کے کاموں میں بھی عمومی تدبیر کرتے ہیں۔ بالآخر، ہم اسے دکھاتے ہیں\nانسان کی خطائیں مخالفت کی تعلیم کے لئے بہترین خطائیں ہیں اور یہ بھی کہ اس طرح سے زیادہ انسان کی طرح منفی گراف پیدا کرنا اضافہ کرسکتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Những mô- tơ-trình tự-lập đã được đào tạo trước đã tạo ra nhiều thành công trong nhiều công việc tạo ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Tuy nhiên, đã có ít công việc phân tích khả năng tạo ra kết quả cơ bản như biểu đồ. Không giống ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, biểu đồ có đặc tính cấu trúc và ngữ pháp khác nhau trong trường hợp làm việc thuộc dòng chữ NLP, v.v. d., tạo ra một đồ thị kết nối và máy tính có thể được quy định bởi các giới hạn cấu trúc của nó, trong khi theo ngữ pháp của đồ thị có thể chỉ ra sự quan trọng của cạnh tượng quan trọng giữa hai khái niệm nút. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu các mô hình ngôn ngữ đã được đào tạo để giải thích và phân tích khả năng của họ để học các giới hạn cấu trúc và ngữ pháp của các biểu đồ. Trước tiên, chúng ta cho thấy rằng với sự giám sát hạn chế, các mô hình ngôn ngữ được rèn luyện thường tạo ra biểu đồ vi phạm những giới hạn hoặc theo ngữ pháp không liên quan. Vì việc quản lý một lượng lớn các biểu đồ được ghi chú con người rất tốn kém và chán nản, chúng tôi đề xuất các cách đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả của các khu vực nổi loạn qua các thao tác nút và sắc cạnh dẫn đến các biểu đồ tích cực và tiêu cực. Tiếp theo, chúng ta sử dụng các biểu đồ này trong các mô hình tương phản khác nhau với các thua Max-Margie và Thông tấn. Cách của chúng tôi dẫn đến cải tiến đáng kể về sự chính xác cấu trúc và ngữ pháp của các giải thích biểu đồ và cũng tổng hợp với các công việc sản xuất đồ thị tương tự. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cho thấy\nLỗi con người là âm bản tốt nhất cho việc học tương phản và cũng là tự động tạo ra các biểu đồ tiêu cực giống con người có thể dẫn đến cải tiến thêm.', 'uz': "Tayyorlangan cheksiz- to- seksiz tilning modellari ko'pchilik natijasida foydalanuvchi vazifalarda kengaytirilgan muvaffaqiyatlarni oshadi. Lekin, grafik kabi rasmlarni yaratish imkoniyatini aniqlash uchun juda qisqa ishlar bor. Ikki tarkibi tilda grafiklar NLP vazifasida ajratilgan structural va semantik xossalari bor, masalan, Ulangan grafik yaratish va acyklic tuzilishi structural chegaralariga e g a boʻlishi mumkin, va grafikning semantikasi ikki node conceptlarining orasidagi aloqani qanday bogʻlash mumkin. Bu ishda, biz o'rganishdan oldin o'rganilgan tillar modellarini o'rganamiz. Ular faqatlarni oxiriga o'rganish va bu grafikning tuzuvlarini o'rganish qobiliyatini analyzeriz. Birinchi marta ko'rsatganimiz, cheksiz taʼminlovchi tillar modellari ko'p o'rtacha grafiklarni yaratadi yoki bu qandaydir tartiblarni ko'rib chiqarishi yoki semantik tartibi bo'lmaydi. Biz oddiy va chegara tahrirlash amallari yordamida oddiy va ishlab chiqarish qoidalarini tahrirlash imkoniyati qilamiz. Bu amallar structural va semantik positive va negativ grafiklar bilan qo'llaniladi. Keyingi, biz bu grafiklarni boshqa o'rganish modellarida o'rganamiz Max-Margin va InfoNCE yoʻqolishi mumkin. Бизнинг усулларимиз, structural ва semantik аниқ тафсилотларни бажаришга ва бошқа бунга ўхшаш график таркибидаги вазифаларга нисбатан катта ўзгартиришларга эга бўлиш керак. Oxirgi, biz buni ko'rsamiz\nInson xatolari contrast o'rganish uchun eng yaxshi negativ va avtomatik qo'shimcha negativ grafiklarni yaratish mumkin. Bu kabi inson kabi negativ grammatika yaxshi o'zgarishni oshirish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Предварително обучените езикови модели последователност към последователност доведоха до широк успех в много задачи за генериране на естествен език. Въпреки това, има сравнително по-малко работа по анализирането на способността им да генерират структурирани изходи като графики. За разлика от естествения език, графиките имат различни структурни и семантични свойства в контекста на задача надолу по веригата, например генерирането на графика, която е свързана и ациклична, може да бъде приписано на нейните структурни ограничения, докато семантиката на графиката може да се отнася до това колко смислено един ръб представлява връзката между две концепции за възли. В тази работа се изучават предварително обучени езикови модели, които генерират обяснителни графики от край до край и анализират способността им да научат структурните ограничения и семантиката на такива графики. Първо показваме, че при ограничен надзор предварително обучените езикови модели често генерират графики, които или нарушават тези ограничения, или са семантично несвързани. Тъй като курирането на голямо количество графи с анотация на хора е скъпо и досадно, ние предлагаме прости, но ефективни начини за смущения на графиките чрез операции за редактиране на възли и ръбове, които водят до структурно и семантично положителни и отрицателни графики. След това използваме тези графики в различни контрастни модели на обучение с загуби от макс маржин и инфонс. Нашите методи водят до значителни подобрения в структурната и семантичната точност на обяснителните графики и обобщават към други подобни задачи за генериране на графики. И накрая, показваме, че\nчовешките грешки са най-добрите негативи за контрастивно обучение и също така, че автоматично генерирането на повече подобни човешки негативни графики може да доведе до по-нататъшни подобрения.', 'da': 'Forududdannede sekvens-til-sekvens sprogmodeller har ført til udbredt succes i mange naturlige sproggenereringsopgaver. Der har dog været relativt mindre arbejde med at analysere deres evne til at generere strukturerede output såsom grafer. I modsætning til det naturlige sprog har grafer særskilte strukturelle og semantiske egenskaber i forbindelse med en downstream NLP-opgave, f.eks. generering af en graf, der er forbundet og acyklisk kan tilskrives dens strukturelle begrænsninger, mens semantikken af en graf kan referere til, hvor meningsfuldt en kant repræsenterer forholdet mellem to knudebegreber. I dette arbejde studerer vi forududdannede sprogmodeller, der genererer forklaringsgrafer på en end-to-end måde og analyserer deres evne til at lære de strukturelle begrænsninger og semantik af sådanne grafer. Vi viser først, at med begrænset overvågning genererer prætrænede sprogmodeller ofte grafer, der enten overtræder disse begrænsninger eller er semantisk inkonsekvent. Da det er dyrt og kedeligt at kurere store mængder menneskelige-annoterede grafer, foreslår vi enkle, men effektive måder at grafforstyrre via node- og kantredigeringsoperationer, der fører til strukturelt og semantisk positive og negative grafer. Dernæst udnytter vi disse grafer i forskellige kontrastive læringsmodeller med Max-Margin og InfoNCE tab. Vores metoder fører til betydelige forbedringer i både strukturel og semantisk nøjagtighed af forklaringsgrafer og genererer også til andre lignende grafgenereringsopgaver. Endelig viser vi, at\nmenneskelige fejl er de bedste negative for kontrastiv læring, og også at automatisk generering af flere sådanne menneskelige lignende negative grafer kan føre til yderligere forbedringer.', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide sequence-to-sequence taalmodellen hebben geleid tot wijdverbreid succes in veel natuurlijke taalgeneratietaken. Er is echter relatief minder werk gedaan aan het analyseren van hun vermogen om gestructureerde outputs zoals grafieken te genereren. In tegenstelling tot natuurlijke taal hebben grafieken verschillende structurele en semantische eigenschappen in de context van een downstream NLP-taak, bijvoorbeeld het genereren van een grafiek die verbonden is en acyclisch kan worden toegeschreven aan zijn structurele beperkingen, terwijl de semantiek van een grafiek kan verwijzen naar hoe betekenisvol een rand de relatie tussen twee knoopconcepten vertegenwoordigt. In dit werk bestuderen we voorgetrainde taalmodellen die op een end-to-end manier uitleg grafieken genereren en analyseren we hun vermogen om de structurele beperkingen en semantiek van dergelijke grafieken te leren. We laten eerst zien dat voorgetrainde taalmodellen met beperkte supervisie vaak grafieken genereren die deze beperkingen schenden of semantisch incoherent zijn. Aangezien het cureren van een grote hoeveelheid door mensen geannoteerde grafieken duur en vervelend is, stellen we eenvoudige maar effectieve manieren voor om grafiekverstoringen via node en edge edit operaties voor die leiden tot structureel en semantisch positieve en negatieve grafieken. Vervolgens gebruiken we deze grafieken in verschillende contrastieve leermodellen met Max-Margin en InfoNCE verliezen. Onze methodes leiden tot significante verbeteringen in zowel structurele als semantische nauwkeurigheid van verklaringsgraffen en veralgemenen ook naar andere soortgelijke grafiek generatie taken. Ten slotte laten we zien dat\nMenselijke fouten zijn de beste negatieven voor contrastief leren en ook dat automatisch genereren van meer mensachtige negatieve grafieken kan leiden tot verdere verbeteringen.', 'hr': 'Pre-obučeni jezički modeli u sekvenciji doveli su do širokog uspjeha u mnogim zadacima generacije prirodnog jezika. Međutim, bilo je relativno manje posla na analiziranju njihove sposobnosti proizvedenja strukturiranih ishoda poput grafika. Za razliku od prirodnog jezika, grafike imaju različite strukturne i semantičke vlasništvo u kontekstu donjeg zadatka NLP-a, npr. proizvedenje grafa koji je povezan i akciklički može se priključiti njegovim strukturnim ograničenjima, dok semantike grafa mogu referirati na to kako značajno granica predstavlja odnos između dva koncepta čvorova. U ovom poslu, proučavamo predobučene jezičke modele koji stvaraju grafike objašnjavanja na kraju do kraja i analiziraju njihovu sposobnost naučiti strukturne ograničenja i semantike takvih grafika. Prvo pokazujemo da s ograničenim nadzorom, predobučenim jezičkim modelima često proizvode grafike koje ili prekršavaju te ograničenja ili su semantički nepošteni. Budući da je ciljanje velike količine ljudskih annotiranih grafika skupa i dosadna, predlažemo jednostavne, ali učinkovite načine perturbacije grafika kroz čvor i granične uredne operacije koje vode do strukturnih, semantički pozitivnih i negativnih grafika. Sljedeće, uključujemo ove grafike u različitim kontrastivnim modelima učenja s gubitkama Max-Margin i InfoNCE-a. Naše metode vode do značajnih poboljšanja i strukturne i semantičke preciznosti grafika objašnjavanja te također generaliziraju i druge slične zadatke generacije grafa. Na kraju, pokažemo to\nLjudske greške su najbolje negativne za kontrastivno učenje, a također da automatski proizvedenje takvih negativnih grafika poput ljudi može dovesti do daljnjih poboljšanja.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Sprachmodelle haben in vielen natürlichen Sprachgenerierungsaufgaben zu weitreichenden Erfolgen geführt. Allerdings gab es relativ wenig Arbeit an der Analyse ihrer Fähigkeit, strukturierte Ergebnisse wie Graphen zu generieren. Anders als natürliche Sprache haben Graphen im Kontext einer nachgelagerten NLP-Aufgabe unterschiedliche strukturelle und semantische Eigenschaften, z.B. die Erzeugung eines Graphen, der verbunden ist und azyklisch seinen strukturellen Einschränkungen zugeordnet werden kann, während die Semantik eines Graphen darauf verweisen kann, wie sinnvoll eine Kante die Beziehung zwischen zwei Knotenkonzepten darstellt. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir vortrainierte Sprachmodelle, die Erklärungsgrafiken End-to-End generieren und analysieren deren Fähigkeit, strukturelle Einschränkungen und Semantik solcher Graphen zu erlernen. Zunächst zeigen wir, dass vortrainierte Sprachmodelle unter eingeschränkter Aufsicht oft Graphen erzeugen, die entweder diese Einschränkungen verletzen oder semantisch inkohärent sind. Da das Kuratieren einer großen Anzahl von human-annotierten Graphen teuer und mühsam ist, schlagen wir einfache, aber effektive Methoden der Graphenstörungen mittels Knoten- und Kantenbearbeitungsoperationen vor, die zu strukturell und semantisch positiven und negativen Graphen führen. Als nächstes nutzen wir diese Graphen in verschiedenen kontrastiven Lernmodellen mit Max-Margin- und InfoNCE-Verlusten. Unsere Methoden führen zu signifikanten Verbesserungen sowohl der strukturellen als auch der semantischen Genauigkeit von Erklärungsgrafiken und verallgemeinern auch auf andere ähnliche Graphengenerierungsaufgaben. Schließlich zeigen wir, dass\nMenschliche Fehler sind die besten Negative für kontrastives Lernen und auch, dass automatisch mehr solche menschenähnlichen negativen Graphen zu weiteren Verbesserungen führen können.', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 서열부터 서열 언어 모델까지 많은 자연 언어 생성 임무에서 광범위한 성공을 거두었다.그러나 구조화된 출력(예를 들어 도형)을 생성하는 능력을 분석하는 데는 작업이 상대적으로 적다.자연 언어와 달리 그림은 하류 NLP 임무의 상하문에서 서로 다른 구조와 의미 속성을 가진다. 예를 들어 연결되고 비순환적인 그림을 생성하는 것은 그 구조의 제약에 기인할 수 있고 그림의 의미는 두 노드 개념 간의 관계를 어떻게 의미 있게 나타낼 수 있는지를 가리킬 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 해석도를 처음부터 끝까지 생성하는 사전 훈련된 언어 모델을 연구하고 이런 그림의 구조적 구속과 의미를 학습하는 능력을 분석한다.우리는 우선 유한한 감독 아래 미리 훈련된 언어 모델은 이런 제약을 위반하거나 의미가 일관되지 않은 그림을 만들어 낸다는 것을 보여준다.대량의 인류 주석도를 관리하는 비용이 높고 번거롭기 때문에 우리는 노드와 편집 조작을 통해 그림의 교란을 실현하는 간단하고 효과적인 방법을 제시했다. 이런 조작은 구조와 의미상의 양부도를 초래할 수 있다.다음에 우리는 서로 다른 비교 학습 모델에서 이 도표를 이용하여 최대 이윤과 정보 손실을 얻는다.우리의 방법은 석도의 구조와 의미의 정확성을 크게 향상시키고 다른 유사한 도형 생성 임무에 보급한다.마지막으로 우리는 증명한다\n인위적인 오류는 학습에 있어서 가장 좋은 부정적인 요소이며, 인간과 유사한 부정적인 그림을 자동으로 더 많이 생성하면 더욱 많은 개선을 가져올 수 있다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زبانی پیش آموزش داده شده\u200cاند که در بسیاری از وظیفه\u200cهای نسل زبانی طبیعی موفقیت را گسترش داده\u200cاند. با این حال، کار نسبتا کمتر در تحلیل توانایی آنها برای تولید نتیجه ساخته شده مانند گراف وجود داشته است. برخلاف زبان طبیعی، گرافیک\u200cها ویژه\u200cهای ساختاری و semantic مختلف در محیط یک کار NLP پایین دارند، مثال تولید گرافی که متصل شده و آسیکلیک است می\u200cتواند به محدودیت ساختاری خود نسبت دهد، در حالی که semantics از گراف می\u200cتواند به عنوان معنی یک مرز ارتباط بین دو مفهوم گراف نشان دهد. در این کار، ما مدل های پیش آموزش زبانی را مطالعه می کنیم که گرافیک توضیح را به طریق پایان و پایان تولید می کنند و توانایی آنها را برای یاد گرفتن محدودیت ساختاری و semantics از چنین گرافیک تحلیل می کنند. اولین بار نشان می دهیم که با مدل های تحقیق محدودیت، پیش آموزش زبان اغلب گرافی می\u200cسازند که یا این محدودیت را شکسته می\u200cکنند، یا به طور طبیعی غیرقابل تعریف می\u200cکنند. از آنجایی که تعداد زیادی از گراف\u200cهای مشخص بشر گران و خسته است، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم راه\u200cهای ساده و تاثیر گراف\u200cها را از طریق گراف و عملیات تغییر کنار که به گراف\u200cهای مثبت و منفی و ساده\u200cای رخ می\u200cدهند. بعدش، ما این گرافیکها را در مدل یادگیری متفاوتی با خسارت Max-Margin و InfoNCE تغییر می دهیم. روش\u200cهای ما به بهترین توجه\u200cهای عمومی در ساختاری و سیمانتی از گرافیک توضیح می\u200cدهند و همچنین به کار های دیگر نسل گراف مشابه می\u200cکنند. بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم که\nخطاهای انسان بهترین منفی برای یادگیری متفاوتی و همچنین که توسط خودکار تولید کردن گرافهای منفی مانند انسان\u200cها می\u200cتواند به بهترین پیشرفت\u200cهای بیشتری برساند.', 'tr': 'Öňki bilinmeli hatlaryň sanlary tebigy dil döredilişinde täsirli başarnygy ýasalandyrdy. Ýöne grafikler ýaly strukturly çykyşlary döretmek üçin olaryň ukyplaryny çözümlemek üçin biraz az iş ýok. Dowatly dil ýaly, grafikleriň düşük NLP işiniň kontekstinde a ýratyn struktur we semantik häsiýetleri bar, meselâ, baglanýan we asyklik grafikleri öz strukturlarynyň çykyşlaryna g örkezilip biler, bir grafyň semantikleri iki düğüm düşünjesi arasynda nähili ylalaşyk diýip sorap biler. Bu işde, öň-bilim bilim nusgalaryny öwrenýäp, soňra-soňra grafikleri düşündirip bilmek üçin ukyplaryny çözülýäris we olaryň ýaly grafikleriň strukturlary we semantiklerini öwrenmek üçin çözülýäris. Ilkinji gezek diýip çakyn nadirim bilen, öň-bilim edilen dil nusgalarynyň köplenç bu sowgatlary döwletlendirmegini ýa-da semantik täsirli döwletleri döwrülýäris. İnsan nähili tanyş eden grafikleriň uly görnüşi pahalı we ýok bolup geçirýändiginden bu sebäpli grafikleriň üýtgewleri düğüm we çöplük edip strukturly we semantik olaryň pozitif we negatif grafikleriň ýüzerinden basit we etkinlik ýüzerini teklip edip bilýäris. Indiki bu grafikleri Max-Margin we InfoNCE ýitirmekleri bilen farklı kontrast öwrenmek nusgalarynda süýtgedýäris Biziň yönlerimiz hem strukturlaryň hem semantik grafikleriň takyklyklygynda möhüm gelişmelere sebep edýär we hem beýleki ýaly grafik generalizasynda üýtgeşdirýär. Soňunda biz şony\nAdamlar ýalñyşlary, kontrast öwrenmek üçin iň gowy negatiýatlykdyr we şonuň üçin adam ýaly negatiýat grafiklerini otomatik-de üýtgetmek üçin gowy gelişmelere ýok edip biler.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha zilizo na mafunzo ya awali umesababisha mafanikio makubwa katika kazi nyingi za kizazi cha lugha za asili. Hata hivyo, kumekuwa na kazi ndogo ya uchambuzi uwezo wao wa kutengeneza matokeo yaliyotengenezwa kama vile picha. Tofauti na lugha ya asili, picha zina vifaa tofauti tofauti katika muktadha wa kazi ya NLP ya chini ya mto, kwa mfano, kutengeneza picha inayounganishwa na michezo inaweza kutengeneza vizuizi vyake vya ujenzi, wakati mifano ya picha inaweza maana ya jinsi upande unavyomaanisha uhusiano kati ya dhana mbili za node. Katika kazi hii, tunasoma mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla ambayo inaleta maelezo ya ufafanuzi kwa njia ya mwisho ya mwisho na uchambuzi uwezo wao wa kujifunza vikwazo vya ujenzi na mifumo ya picha hizo. We first show that with limited supervision, pre-trained language models often generate graphs that either violate these constraints or are semantically incoherent.  Kwa kuwa kutafuta idadi kubwa ya picha za binadamu zina gharama na yenye kutisha, tunapendekeza njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi za mabadiliko ya picha kupitia node na upande wa mabadiliko yanayopelekea miundombinu na picha chanya na hasi. Baadae, tunatumia picha hizi katika mifano tofauti ya kujifunza yenye hasara ya Max-Margin na InfoNCE. Mindo yetu inapelekea maboresho makubwa katika miundombinu na uhakika wa nusu ya maelezo na pia inafanya kazi nyingine za kizazi kama hizo. Mwisho, tunaonyesha\nmakosa ya binadamu ni hasi bora ya kujifunza kinyume na pia kwamba kutengeneza picha hasi kama hizi za binadamu zinaweza kusababisha maboresho zaidi.', 'id': 'Model bahasa dari urutan ke urutan yang dilatih telah menyebabkan sukses yang luas dalam banyak tugas generasi bahasa alam. Namun, ada relatif sedikit pekerjaan untuk menganalisa kemampuan mereka untuk menghasilkan output struktur seperti grafik. Tidak seperti bahasa alami, grafik memiliki properti struktur dan semantis yang berbeda dalam konteks tugas NLP turun, misalnya, menghasilkan grafik yang terhubung dan asiklik dapat diaktifkan kepada batasan strukturnya, sementara semantis grafik dapat merujuk bagaimana artinya sebuah pinggir mewakili hubungan antara dua konsep node. In this work, we study pre-trained language models that generate explanation graphs in an end-to-end manner and analyze their ability to learn the structural constraints and semantics of such graphs.  Kami pertama-tama menunjukkan bahwa dengan pengawasan terbatas, model bahasa pra-terlatih sering menghasilkan grafik yang sama ada melanggar batas ini atau secara semantis tidak konsisten. Karena mengurus jumlah besar grafik yang dicatat manusia mahal dan membosankan, kami menyarankan cara sederhana namun efektif mengganggu grafik melalui operasi edit node dan pinggir yang membawa ke grafik struktural dan semantis positif dan negatif. Selanjutnya, kita menggunakan grafik ini dalam model belajar kontras yang berbeda dengan kehilangan Max-Margin dan InfoNCE. Metode kami membawa ke peningkatan yang signifikan dalam akurezi struktur dan semantis grafik penjelasan dan juga menyebarkan ke tugas generasi grafik yang sama lainnya. Akhirnya, kita menunjukkan bahwa\nkesalahan manusia adalah negatif terbaik untuk belajar kontras dan juga bahwa secara otomatis menghasilkan lebih banyak grafik negatif seperti manusia dapat menyebabkan perkembangan lanjut.', 'am': 'Pre-trained sequence-to-sequence language models have led to widespread success in many natural language generation tasks.  ምንም እንኳን፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ውጤቶችን እንደ ቀረጽ መፍጠር በሚችል ላይ የሚያስተምር ሥራ በጣም ትንሽ ሆኖአል፡፡ በተለየ አካባቢ ቋንቋ፣ ካርፎች ከታችኛው ውኃ NLP ስራ ውስጥ የተለየ ሥርዓት እና የsemantic ምርጫዎች አሉ፤ ለምሳሌ የተጠያየቁትን graph እና acyclic ግንኙነት ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ ቀድሞ ተማሪ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን እናስተምራለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ እናሳየዋለን፣ በተወሰነ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች፣ እነዚህን ግንኙነቶች የሚያፈርሱ ወይም ተሳማሚ የማይሆኑትን ግልጾች እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሰው ግንኙነት ብዛት የከበረ እና የተደነቀ ነው ስለዚህም፣ በአካባቢና እና በአካባቢ እና በአፍሪካዊ እና በአፍሪካዊ እና በአፍሪካዊ እና በአካባቢ እና በአካባቢ እና የክፍል ግንኙነት የሚያሳውቀውን የግልፅ ግንኙነት እና የአፍሪካዊ ግንኙነት የሚያሳውቀውን የግ የሚቀጥለው፣ እነዚህን ቀረፎች በተለየ ትምህርት ሞዴላዎችን በተለየ ማርጊን እና የኢንተርኔክሲ ከሳራ ጋር እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የሥርዓት እና የsemantic ትክክለኛ ግንኙነትን እና ለሌላ የሚመስል የግራፍ ትውልድ ስራዎችን ማቀናቀል እና ትክክል ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ መጨረሻ እናሳየዋለን\nየሰው ስህተቶች ተቃዋሚ ትምህርት የተሻለ ነnegative ናቸው እና ደግሞ እንደዚህ ያለ የሰው ብዛት የnegative ቀለበቶች አቅራቢያ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': "Modelet e paratrajnuara të gjuhës nga sekuenca në sekuencë kanë çuar në sukses të gjerë në shumë detyra të gjenerimit natyror të gjuhës. Megjithatë, ka patur relativisht më pak punë në analizimin e aftësisë së tyre për të gjeneruar rezultate të strukturuara të tilla si grafikët. Në kundërshtim me gjuhën natyrore, grafikët kanë pronësi strukturore dhe semantike të veçanta në kontekstin e një detyre NLP poshtë, për shembull, gjenerimi i një grafiku që është i lidhur dhe aksiklik mund t'i atribuohet kufizimeve strukturore të tij, ndërsa semantika e një grafiku mund të referohet sa me kuptim një krah përfaqëson marrëdhënien midis dy koncepteve të nyjeve. Në këtë punë, ne studiojmë modele gjuhësh të paratrajnuara që gjenerojnë grafikë shpjegimi në një mënyrë nga fundi në fund dhe analizojmë aftësinë e tyre për të mësuar kufizimet strukturore dhe semantikën e grafikëve të tilla. Ne së pari tregojmë se me mbikqyrje të kufizuar, modelet e gjuhës së paratrajnuar shpesh gjenerojnë grafikë që ose shkelën këto kufizime ose janë semantikisht të pakoheshme. Duke qenë se kurimi i sasisë së madhe të grafikave të anotuara nga njerëzit është i shtrenjtë dhe i mërzitshëm, ne propozojmë mënyra të thjeshta por efektive të shqetësimeve të grafikave nëpërmjet operacioneve të editimit të nyjeve dhe kufijve që çojnë në grafikë strukturalisht dhe semantikisht pozitive dhe negative. Pastaj, ne i përdorim këto grafikë në modele të ndryshme të mësimit kontrastuese me humbjet Max-Margin dhe InfoNCE. Metodat tona çojnë në përmirësime të rëndësishme në saktësinë strukturore dhe semantike të grafikave të shpjegimit dhe gjithashtu gjeneralizohen në detyra të tjera të ngjashme të gjenerimit të grafikave. Lastly, we show that\ngabimet njerëzore janë negativët më të mira për mësimin kontrastues dhe gjithashtu se krijimi automatik i më shumë grafikëve negative të tilla si njerëzit mund të shpjerë në përmirësime të mëtejshme.", 'af': "Vorige opgelei volgorde-na-volgorde taal modele het gelei na verspreidige sukses in baie natuurlike taal generasie-taak. Maar daar is relativief minder werk om hul kapasiteit te analiseer om struktureerde uitvoerdes soos graaf te genereer. Ongelyks van natuurlike taal, graafe het uitdelike strukturele en semantiese eienskappe in die konteks van 'n onderstreem NLP taak, bv. die genereering van 'n graaf wat verbind is en acyclic kan wees aangewys a an sy strukturele beheinings, terwyl die semantieke van 'n graaf kan verwys na hoe betekenlik 'n rand die verwanting tussen twee node konsepte verteenwoordig word. In hierdie werk, onderwerp ons voor-onderwerp taal modele wat uitduidelings grafieke genereer op 'n einde-tot-einde manier en analyseer hulle moontlikheid om die strukturele begrenkinge en semantieke van sodanige grafieke te leer. Ons wys eerste dat met beperkte supervisie, vooraf-opgelei taal-modele dikwels grafie genereer wat of hierdie beheininge of semantiese onheilig is. Omdat die wysing van groot hoeveelheid van mens-annotateerde graaf is koste en moeilik, voorstel ons eenvoudige en effektiewe maniere van graaf perturbasies deur node en rand redigeer operasies wat lei na struktureel en semantiese positiewe en negatiewe graaf. Volgende, ons leverer hierdie grafieke in verskillende kontrastiewe leer modele met Max- Margin en InfoNCE verloors. Ons metodes lei na betekende verbeteringe in strukturele en semantiese presisie van uitduidelings grafieke en genereliseer ook na ander gelyke graafgenerasietaake. Las, ons wys dat\nmenslike foute is die beste negatiewe vir kontrastiewe leer en ook wat automaties meer sodanige menslike negatiewe grafieke genereer kan lei na verdere verbeteringe.", 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված լեզվի հաջորդականության լեզվի մոդելները հանգեցրել են տարածված հաջողության շատ բնական լեզվի ստեղծման խնդիրներում: Սակայն, համեմատաբար ավելի քիչ աշխատանք է կատարվել վերլուծում նրանց կարողությունը ստեղծել կառուցվածքավորված արդյունքներ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ գծագրերը: Ի տարբերություն բնական լեզվին, գրաֆիկները ունեն տարբեր կառուցվածքային և սեմանտիկ հատկություններ, օրինակ՝ կապված գծագրի ստեղծելը, որը կարող է պատկերացնել կառուցվածքային սահմանափակումներին, մինչդեռ գրաֆիկի սեմանտիկան կարող է նշել, թե ինչքան իմաստավոր է սահմանը ներկայացնում երկու հանգույցի միջև եղած հար Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելներ, որոնք վերջում-վերջում բացատրություններ են ստեղծում և վերլուծում են նրանց կարողությունը սովորել այդ գծագրերի կառուցվածքային սահմանափակումները և սեմանտիկան: Սկզբում ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սահմանափակ վերահսկողության դեպքում նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները հաճախ ստեղծում են գրաֆիկներ, որոնք կամ խախտում են այս սահմանափակումները, կամ սեմանտիկապես անհամապատասխան են: Since curating large amount of human-annotated graphs is expensive and tedious, we propose simple yet effective ways of graph perturbations via node and edge edit operations that lead to structurally and semantically positive and negative graphs.  Հաջորդ, մենք օգտագործում ենք այս գրաֆիկները տարբեր հակադրական ուսումնական մոդելներում Մաքս-Մարգինի և Ինֆորանսի կորստի հետ: Մեր մեթոդները հանգեցնում են բացատրությունների գրաֆիկների կառուցվածքային և սեմանտիկական ճշգրտության կարևոր բարելավմաններին, ինչպես նաև ընդհանրացնում են գրաֆիկների այլ նման առաջադրանքներին: Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս,\nմարդկային սխալները հակադրական ուսումնասիրության լավագույն բացասական են, ինչպես նաև այն, որ ինքնաբերաբար ավելի շատ մարդկային նման բացասական գրաֆիկներ ստեղծելը կարող է առաջացնել ավելի լավ բարելավումներ:', 'bs': 'Pre-obučeni jezički modeli u sekvenci doveli su do širokog uspjeha u mnogim zadacima generacije prirodnog jezika. Međutim, bilo je relativno manje posla na analiziranju njihove sposobnosti stvaranja strukturiranih ishoda poput grafika. Za razliku od prirodnog jezika, grafici imaju različite strukturne i semantičke vlasništvo u kontekstu donjeg zadatka NLP-a, npr. proizvedenje grafa koji je povezan i akciklički može biti pripisano svojim strukturnim ograničenjima, dok semantika grafa može da se odnosi na to kako značajno granica predstavlja odnos između dva koncepta čvorova. U ovom poslu, proučavamo predobučene jezičke modele koji stvaraju grafike objašnjenja na kraju i analiziraju njihovu sposobnost naučiti strukturne ograničenja i semantike takvih grafa. Prvo pokazujemo da sa ograničenim nadzorom, predobučenim jezičkim modelima često proizvode grafike koje ili prekršavaju te ograničenja ili su semantički nepoherene. Budući da je ciljanje velike količine ljudskih annotiranih grafika skupa i dosadna, predlažemo jednostavne, ali efikasne načine perturbacije grafika preko čvorova i graničnih edicionalnih operacija koje vode do strukturnih, semantički pozitivnih i negativnih grafika. Sljedeće, uključujemo ove grafike u različite kontrastivne modele učenja sa gubitkama Max-Margin i InfoNCE-a. Naše metode vode do značajnih poboljšanja i strukturne i semantičke preciznosti grafika objašnjavanja i generalizuju i druge slične zadatke generacije grafa. Na kraju, pokažemo to\nLjudske greške su najbolje negativne za kontrastivno učenje, a također da automatski proizvedenje takvih negativnih grafika poput ljudi može dovesti do daljnjih poboljšanja.', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sequence-to-sequence dil modelləri təbiətli dil təhsil işlərində çoxlu başarılı olaraq yayıldılar. Lakin, grafiklər kimi strukturlı çıxışlar yaratmaq üçün onların yetkinliklərini analizə etmək üçün çox azdır. Təbiətli dilə bənzər, grafiklərin düşük NLP işin in məsələsində fərqli strukturlar və semantik özellikləri var, məsələn, bağlı və aciklik grafik yaratması onun strukturlarıyla müəyyən edilə bilər, bir grafın semantikləri nə qədər anlamlı bir kənarın iki düyüm məsələlərinin bağlılığını g östərdiyinə baxır. Bu işdə, biz əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modellərini təhsil edirik ki, grafikləri sona qədər təfsil edir və böyük grafiklərin strukturlu sərtlərini və semantiklərini öyrənmək bacarıqlarını analiz edir. Biz ilk dəfə belə göstəririk ki, sınırlı təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri çox çox əvvəlki təhsil edir, yoxsa bu müddətləri pozur, yoxsa semantik müxtəlif deyillər. İnsan nöqtəsi ilə yazılmış Grafiklərin böyük dəyişiklikləri ucuz və sıxıntılı olduğundan bu yana, düyüm və çərçi düzəltmə işləri, strukturlu, semantik olaraq pozitif və negatif grafiklərə yol verən grafik perturbasyonunun basit, etkili yollarını təklif edirik. Sonra, bu grafikləri Max-Margin və InfoNCE kaybıyla müxtəlif müxtəlif öyrənmə modellərə təmin edirik. Bizim metodlarımız strukturlu və semantik qrafların açıq-aydınlıqlarının dəyişikliklərinə və digər bənzər grafik nəsillərinin işlərinə də generalize edir. Sonunda, biz bunu göstəririk\nİnsan xətaları müxtəlif öyrənmək üçün ən yaxşı negatifdir və həmçinin bu insanlar kimi negatif grafikləri özündən daha çox yaratmaq üçün daha yaxşılıqlara yol açar.', 'bn': 'Pre-trained sequence-to-sequence language models have led to widespread success in many natural language generation tasks.  তবে গ্রাফের মতো কাঠামো আউটপুট তৈরি করার ক্ষমতা বিশ্লেষণের ব্যাপারে প্রায় কম কাজ রয়েছে। প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষায় গ্রাফের একটি নীচে এনএলপি কাজের প্রেক্ষাপটে বিভিন্ন কাঠামো এবং সেমান্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য রয়েছে, যেমন একটি গ্রাফ তৈরি করা হয়েছে যা সংযুক্ত এবং একাইক্লিক তার কাঠামোর ন এই কাজে আমরা পূর্বপূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল গবেষণা করছি যা শেষ পর্যন্ত গ্রাফের ব্যাখ্যা সৃষ্টি করে এবং এই ধরনের গ্রাফের কাঠামোর নিয়ন্ত্রণ ও স আমরা প্রথমে দেখাচ্ছি যে সীমিত পর্যবেক্ষণের মাধ্যমে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল প্রায়শই গ্রাফ তৈরি করে যে এই নিয়ম লঙ্ঘন করে অথব যেহেতু বিশাল পরিমাণ মানুষ-পরিচিত গ্রাফের মুক্তি দামী এবং বিপদজনক, আমরা সাধারণ এবং কার্যকর কার্যক্রমের মাধ্যমে গ্রাফ বিচ্ছিন্ন করার প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি যা কা পরবর্তীতে, আমরা এই গ্রাফ বিভিন্ন বিরোধী শিক্ষার মডেলে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভি আমাদের পদ্ধতি কাঠামো এবং সেম্পেন্টিক পরিস্থিতিতে ব্যাখ্যা করা গ্রাফ এবং অন্যান্য একই ধরনের গ্রাফ প্রজন্মের কাজের সাথে স শেষে, আমরা এটা দেখাচ্ছি\nমানুষের ভুল হচ্ছে বিরোধী শিক্ষার জন্য সবচেয়ে ভাল নেতিবাচক এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এই ধরনের মানবের মত নেতিবাচক গ্রাফ তৈরি করা', 'cs': 'Předškolené modely jazyků sekvence na sekvenci vedly k širokému úspěchu v mnoha úkolech generace přirozeného jazyka. Nicméně, bylo relativně méně práce na analýze jejich schopnosti generovat strukturované výstupy, jako jsou grafy. Na rozdíl od přirozeného jazyka mají grafy odlišné strukturální a sémantické vlastnosti v kontextu následného NLP úlohy, např. generování grafu, který je propojen a acyklický lze přičíst jeho strukturálním omezením, zatímco sémantika grafu může odkazovat na to, jak smysluplně hrana reprezentuje vztah mezi dvěma koncepty uzlu. V této práci studujeme předškolené jazykové modely, které generují vysvětlovací grafy end-to-end způsobem a analyzujeme jejich schopnost naučit se strukturální omezení a sémantiku těchto grafů. Nejprve ukazujeme, že s omezeným dohledem předškolené jazykové modely často generují grafy, které buď porušují tato omezení, nebo jsou sémanticky nesouvislé. Vzhledem k tomu, že vedení velkého množství lidských anotovaných grafů je drahé a únavné, navrhujeme jednoduché, ale efektivní způsoby poruchy grafů prostřednictvím operací editace uzlů a hran, které vedou ke strukturálně a sémanticky pozitivním a negativním grafům. Dále tyto grafy využíváme v různých kontrastních modelech učení se ztrátami Max-Margin a InfoNCE. Naše metody vedou k výraznému zlepšení strukturální i sémantické přesnosti vysvětlovacích grafů a také zobecňují na další podobné úlohy generování grafů. Nakonec ukazujeme, že\nLidské chyby jsou nejlepšími negativy pro kontrastní učení a také to, že automatické generování více takových lidských negativních grafů může vést k dalšímu zlepšení.', 'et': 'Eelnevalt koolitatud järjestusest järjestuseni keelemudelid on viinud paljude looduskeele genereerimise ülesannete täitmisel laialdase eduni. Siiski on tehtud suhteliselt vähem tööd nende võime analüüsimisel luua struktureeritud väljundeid, näiteks graafikuid. Erinevalt looduslikust keelest on graafikel erinevad struktuurilised ja semantilised omadused järgneva NLP ülesande kontekstis, nt ühendatud ja atsüklilise graafiku genereerimine saab omistada struktuurilistele piirangutele, samas kui graafiku semantika võib viidata sellele, kuidas serv tähenduslikult esindab seost kahe sõlme kontseptsiooni vahel. Selles töös uurime eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudeleid, mis genereerivad selgitusgraafikuid otsast otsani ning analüüsime nende võimet õppida selliste graafikute struktuurilisi piiranguid ja semantikat. Esiteks näitame, et piiratud järelevalve korral genereerivad eelkoolitud keelemudelid sageli graafikuid, mis kas rikuvad neid piiranguid või on semantiliselt ebaühtlased. Kuna suure hulga inimlike annoteeritud graafikute kureerimine on kallis ja tüütu, pakume välja lihtsaid, kuid efektiivseid graafikute häirete viise sõlmede ja servade redigeerimise toimingute kaudu, mis viivad struktuurselt ja semantiliselt positiivsete ja negatiivsete graafikuteni. Seejärel kasutame neid graafikuid erinevates kontrastsetes õppemudelites Max-Margin ja InfoNCE kaotustega. Meie meetodid toovad kaasa märkimisväärse paranemise nii struktuurses kui semantilises täpsuses selgitusgraafikud ning üldistavad ka teiste sarnaste graafikute genereerimise ülesannete jaoks. Lõpuks näitame, et\nInimlikud vead on kontrastiivse õppimise parimad negatiivsed aspektid ning samuti see, et automaatselt rohkem selliseid inimlikke negatiivseid graafikuid võib viia edasiste parandusteni.', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut sekvenssi-sekvenssi-kielimallit ovat johtaneet laajaan menestykseen monissa luonnollisen kielen tuottamisessa tehtävissä. Niiden kykyä luoda strukturoituja tuotoksia, kuten kaavioita, on kuitenkin tutkittu suhteellisen vähän. Toisin kuin luonnollinen kieli, graafilla on erilliset rakenteelliset ja semanttiset ominaisuudet loppupään NLP-tehtävän yhteydessä, esim. yhdistetyn ja asyklisen graafin luominen voidaan katsoa sen rakenteellisten rajoitteiden vuoksi, kun taas graafin semantiikka voi viitata siihen, miten merkityksellisesti reuna edustaa kahden solmukäsitteen välistä suhdetta. Tässä työssä tutkitaan valmiiksi koulutettuja kielimalleja, jotka tuottavat selityskaavioita päästä päähän ja analysoidaan niiden kykyä oppia tällaisten kaavioiden rakenteellisia rajoituksia ja semantiikkaa. Osoitamme ensin, että rajoitetulla valvonnalla esikoulutetut kielimallit tuottavat usein graafeja, jotka joko rikkovat näitä rajoituksia tai ovat semanttisesti epäjohdonmukaisia. Koska suuren määrän ihmisen annotoituja graafeja kuratoidaan kalliiksi ja tylsäksi, ehdotamme yksinkertaisia mutta tehokkaita tapoja graafien häiriöihin solmu- ja reunamuokkausoperaatioiden avulla, jotka johtavat rakenteellisesti ja semanttisesti positiivisiin ja negatiivisiin graafeihin. Seuraavaksi hyödynnämme näitä kaavioita erilaisissa kontrastiivisissa oppimismalleissa Max-Margin- ja InfoNCE-tappioilla. Menetelmämme johtavat merkittäviin parannuksiin selityskaavojen rakenteellisessa ja semanttisessa tarkkuudessa sekä yleistyvät muihin vastaaviin graafien luontitehtäviin. Lopuksi osoitamme, että\nInhimilliset virheet ovat parhaita negatiivisia tekijöitä kontrastiivisessa oppimisessa ja myös se, että ihmisen kaltaisten negatiivisten kaavioiden luominen automaattisesti voi johtaa parannuksiin.', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatge de seqüència a seqüència pré-entrenats han portat a un èxit generalitzat en moltes tasques de generació de llenguatges naturals. No obstant això, hi ha hagut relativament menys treball en analitzar la seva habilitat de generar productes estructurats com els gràfics. A diferència de la llengua natural, els gràfics tenen propietats estructurals i semàntiques diferents en el context d'una tasca de NLP avall, per exemple, generar un gràfic que està connectat i acíclic pot ser atribuit a les seves restriccions estructurals, mentre que la semàntica d'un gràfic pot referir-se a com significativament un bord representa la relació entre dos conceptes de nodos. En aquest treball estudiem models de llenguatge pré-entrenats que generen gràfics d'explicació de manera final a final i analitzen la seva habilitat d'aprendre les restriccions estructurals i semàntiques d'aquests gràfics. We first show that with limited supervision, pre-trained language models often generate graphs that either violate these constraints or are semantically incoherent.  Com que curar gran quantitat de gràfics anotats per humans és cara i tediós, proposem maneres senzilles però efectives de perturbacions gràfics mitjançant operacions d'edició de nodos i bords que porten a gràfics estructuralment i semànticament positius i negatius. Després, utilitzem aquests gràfics en diferents models d'aprenentatge contrastants amb pèrdues de Max-Margin i InfoNCE. Els nostres mètodes porten a millores significatives en la precisió estructural i semàntica dels gràfics d'explicació i també s'generalitzen a altres tasques similars de generació de gràfics. Lastly, we show that\nels errors humans són els millors negatius per a l'aprenentatge contrastiu i també que generar automàticament més gràfics negatius com els humans poden portar a millores ulteriors.", 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, an sami wani aikin da ya yi analyza abincin su iya ƙiƙiro matsalam kamar grafiko. Di motsi da harshen asili, grafyutan sunã da wasu properties masu buƙata cikin muhalli da wani aikin na NLP na ƙarami, misali, ya ƙiƙiri wani grafi wanda ya yi haɗa da shi kuma an kiyaye acyclic kan da tsari na tsari'urarsa, kuma amma, semantikken grafi yana iya muhalli da jini gefen ya nuna danganta tsakanin zaɓen biyu na node. Daga wannan aikin, Munã karanta misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman tsari na harshen, wanda ke ƙara fassarar fassarar, kuma munã yi anayyar da awon su da za'a sanar da tsarin murafa da semanti na wannan grafi. Tuna nũna kwanza, da tsarin da aka tsare, misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman wa-aikin, ko ko kuma za su ƙetare wannan tsarin ko kuma ba su yi lokaci ba. Tana da curbinta girma ga grafyutan mutum yana mai gimia kuma mai ƙididdige, sai za'a buƙata hanyõyi masu sauƙi kuma masu amfani da shiryoyin grafyuta, a kan node da taƙaitar taƙafi, wanda ke ƙara wa rubutu da kafin na rubutu, da kuma daman sigogi. Na ƙarshe, za'a samun waɗannan gragrafyuta cikin misãlai masu iya motsi da aka samu da hasara na Max-Margin da info NCE. Our methods lead to significant improvements in both structural and semantic accuracy of explanation graphs and also generalize to other similar graph generation tasks.  Dakata, za mu nũna\nMataimakin mutane ne mafiya kyakkanci ga elimi mai motsi da ke iya motsi, kuma yana iya ƙarami farat-farat ta zaɓe wasu grafyutan misalin mutane kamar misalin mutane.", 'sk': 'Predhodno usposobljeni jezikovni modeli zaporedja do zaporedja so pripeljali do širokega uspeha pri številnih nalogah ustvarjanja naravnega jezika. Vendar pa je bilo relativno manj dela pri analizi njihove sposobnosti ustvarjanja strukturiranih rezultatov, kot so grafikoni. Za razliko od naravnega jezika imajo grafi različne strukturne in semantične lastnosti v kontekstu nadaljnje naloge NLP, npr. ustvarjanje povezanega in acikličnega grafa je mogoče pripisati njegovim strukturnim omejitvam, medtem ko semantika grafa lahko sklicuje na to, kako pomembno rob predstavlja razmerje med dvema konceptoma vozlišč. V tem delu preučujemo vnaprej usposobljene jezikovne modele, ki ustvarjajo pojasnjevalne grafe na način od konca do konca ter analiziramo njihovo sposobnost učenja strukturnih omejitev in semantike takih grafov. Najprej pokažemo, da z omejenim nadzorom vnaprej usposobljeni jezikovni modeli pogosto ustvarjajo grafe, ki bodisi kršijo te omejitve ali so semantično neskladni. Ker je kuracija velike količine grafikonov s človeškimi oznakami draga in dolgočasna, predlagamo preproste, a učinkovite načine motenj grafov prek operacij urejanja vozlišč in robov, ki vodijo do strukturno in semantično pozitivnih in negativnih grafov. Nato izkoristimo te grafe v različnih kontrastnih modelih učenja z izgubami Max-Margin in InfoNCE. Naše metode vodijo do pomembnih izboljšav strukturne in semantične natančnosti pojasnjevalnih grafov in posplošijo tudi na druge podobne naloge generiranja grafov. Nazadnje dokazujemo, da\nČloveške napake so najboljši negativi za kontrastno učenje in tudi to, da lahko samodejno ustvarjanje več takih človeškim podobnih negativnih grafov vodi do nadaljnjih izboljšav.', 'he': "דוגמני שפת רצף-רצף מאומנים מראש הובילו להצלחה מרוחקת במשימות רבות של יוצר שפת טבעיות. בכל אופן, היו עבודות יחסית פחות על ניתוח היכולת שלהם לייצר תוצאות מובנות כמו גרפים. בניגוד לשפה הטבעית, לגרפים יש תכונות מבנה ומבנות סמנטיות ברורות בקשר למשימה של NLP מתחתית, למשל, ליצור גרף שמקשר ואציקלי יכול להיות מחויב למגבלות מבנה, בזמן שהסמנטיקה של גרף יכולה להתייחס לאיך בצורה משמעותית קצה מייצג את היחסים בין שתי מושג קשרים. בעבודה הזו, אנו לומדים דוגמנים לשפה מאומנים מראש שיוצרים גרפים הסבר בדרך מסוף לסוף ונבחן את היכולת שלהם ללמוד את המגבלות המבנתיות וסמנטיקה של גרפים כאלה. ראשית אנחנו מראים כי עם פיקוח מוגבל, דוגמנים לשפה מאומנים מראש לעתים קרובות יוצרים גרפים שאולי מפרים את ההגבלות האלה או הם סמנטית לא תואמים. מכיוון שטיפול כמות גדולה של גרפים שנמצאים על ידי אדם יקר ומעייף, אנו מציעים דרכים פשוטות אך יעילות של הפרעות גרפים באמצעות פעולות עריכת אצבעות וקצה שמובילות לגרפים מבחינה מבחינה מבחינה מבחינה מבחינה מבחינה סמנטית ושלילילית. לאחר מכן, אנו משתמשים בגרפים האלה בדוגמאות למידה שונות עם הפסדים של מקס-מרג'ין ואינפונס. השיטות שלנו מובילות לשיפורים משמעותיים בדיקת מבנה וסמנטית של גרפים הסבר וגם להתפשט למשימות דומות גרפים דומות אחרות. בסופו של דבר, אנחנו מראים את זה\nשגיאות אנושיות הן השליליות הטובות ביותר ללימודים בניגוד, וגם שגורמים באופן אוטומטי יותר גרפים שליליים דומים לאדם יכולים להוביל לשיפורים נוספים.", 'jv': 'Awak-Awak Devhelp Nanging, ditambah-ditambah liyane wis rabi luwih operasi kanggo ngerasakno ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang dumateng. Unlikely for normal language, graphs have Distant structural and semanti settings in the context Nang gawar iki, kita isih bantuan model sing arep bantuan banjur kuwi nggawe perusahaan anyar tentang-to-end lan nganggep kuwi tindakan nggawe ngubah structural limitingan lan semanti kuwi nggawe barang nggambar. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan karo akeh nguasakno, model sing wis nguasai luwih dumateng, kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe nguasai perusahaan winih dhéwé, ora bisa ngono kuwi ditulaké sampek. Since curing big amount of Human-Adverted graphs is extreme and ted, we proposal simply and effectual paths of graphpertruations by node and Edge edit operations that go to structural and semanti-punctual and ative graphs. Tulung, awak dhéwé menehi nggambar diagram iki ning model sing gak penting nggambar karo Max-Marin karo Infonce Awakdhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi kanggo dianggap nggawe structural karo semanti kuwi kesalahan kanggo ngerasakno nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang urip bantuan kaya sistem sing gawe nguasakno. Yowis, kita ngomongke ki\nEror', 'bo': 'སྔོན་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་གོ་རིམ་དང་གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་བསྐྲུན་ན་ཕན་ཐུན་སྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ ཡིན་ནའང་། དེ་ཚོའི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་པར་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ནུས་པ་ལྟར་ཉུང་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱས་མེད་པ་རེད། Unlike natural language, graphs have distinct structural and semantic properties in the context of a downstream NLP task, e.g., generating a graph that is connected and acyclic can be attributed to its structural constraints, while the semantics of a graph can refer to how meaningful an edge represents the relationship between two nodes. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་པའི་སྐད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚུ་གི་རྣམ་མཇུག་ལ་ཐོག་ལས་དུས་མཇུག་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་བྱེད་པའི་ལྕགས་རིམ་ ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་མཉམ་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐོང་སྣང་བ་དང་སྔོན་གྲངས་འཛིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པ་ནི་རྣམས་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ Since curating large amount of human-annotated graphs is expensive and tedious, we propose simple yet effective ways of graph perturbations via node and edge edit operations that lead to structurally and semantically positive and negative graphs. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིས་འདི་དག་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྲོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་ཡིག་འབྲི་ཚིག་དང་སྔར་ཕྲན་འགྲེལ་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་\nམི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ནི་ཚོ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པར་ཐད་ཀལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Non-neural Models Matter: a Re-evaluation of Neural Referring Expression Generation Systems', 'ar': 'LexSubCon: دمج المعرفة من الموارد المعجمية في تضمين السياق من أجل الاستبدال المعجمي', 'es': 'LexSubCon: Integración del conocimiento de los recursos léxicos en las incorporaciones contextuales para la sustitución léxica', 'pt': 'LexSubCon: Integrando conhecimento de recursos lexicais em incorporações contextuais para substituição lexical', 'fr': 'LexSubCon\xa0: Intégrer les connaissances issues des ressources lexicales dans des intégrations contextuelles pour la substitution lexicale', 'ja': 'LexSubCon ：語彙リソースからの知識を語彙置換のためのコンテキスト埋め込みに統合する', 'zh': 'LexSubCon曰:词汇资集词法代者上下文嵌中', 'ru': 'LexSubCon: Интеграция знаний из лексических ресурсов в  контекстные вставки для лексической замены', 'hi': 'LexSubCon: लेक्सिकल प्रतिस्थापन के लिए प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग में Lexical संसाधनों से ज्ञान को एकीकृत करना', 'ga': "LexSubCon: Eolas as Acmhainní Foclaíochta a Chomhtháthú i Leabú Comhthéacsúla d'Ionadú Foclaíochta", 'hu': 'LexSubCon: A lexikai erőforrásokból származó tudás integrálása a lexikai helyettesítéshez szükséges kontextuális beágyazásokba', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση Γνώσης από Λεξικούς Πόρους σε Ενσωμάτωση Περιεχομένου για Λεξική Αντικατάσταση', 'kk': 'LexSubCon: Лексикалық ресурстардың білімін біріктіру', 'ka': 'LexSubCon: Lexical Resources- ის მეცნიერების ინტერგურაცია', 'it': 'LexSubCon: Integrazione della conoscenza dalle risorse lessicali in incorporazioni contestuali per la sostituzione lessicale', 'mk': 'LexSubCon: Интегрирање на знаењето од лексикалните ресурси во контекстни вградувања за лексикална замена', 'ms': 'LexSubCon: Integrating Knowledge from Lexical Resources into - Contextual Embeddings for Lexical Substitution', 'ml': 'LexSubCon: Integrating Knowledge from Lexical Resources into  Contextual Embeddings for Lexical Substitution', 'lt': 'LexSubCon: Lexical Resources Knowledge Integrating into “ Contextual Embedding for Lexical Substitution', 'mt': 'LexSubCon: L-Integrazzjoni ta’ l-Għarfien mir-Riżorsi Lessiċi fl-“Embeddings Kuntest għas-Sustituzzjoni Lessika”', 'no': 'LexSubCon', 'pl': 'LexSubCon: Integrowanie wiedzy z zasobów leksykalnych do kontekstowych osadzeń dla zastępowania leksykalnego', 'sr': 'LexSubCon: integracija znanja iz leksičkih resursa u „Kontekstualne integracije za leksičku zamjenu”', 'mn': 'LexSubCon: Lexical Resources-аас мэдлэгийг нэгтгэх', 'ro': 'LexSubCon: Integrarea cunoștințelor din resursele Lexicale în încorporarea contextuală pentru substituirea Lexicală', 'si': 'LexSubCon: ලෙක්සිකාල් ස්වභාවිතයෙන් දැනගන්න', 'so': 'LexSubCon: Integration Knowledge from Lexical Resources into *Content Embedding for Lexical Substitution', 'sv': 'LexSubCon: Integrera kunskap från Lexical Resources i kontextuella inbäddningar för Lexical Substitution', 'ta': 'LexSubCon: லெக்சிக்கல் மூலங்களிலிருந்து அறிவை சேர்', 'ur': 'LexSubCon: Lexical Resources سے علم Integrating into ،Contextual Embeddings for Lexical Substitution', 'uz': 'LexSubCon: Leksikal Resource bilan maò¥lumot qoò£yish', 'vi': 'Dịch vụ Lexie trong môi trường nền cộng hoà', 'da': 'LexSubCon: Integrering af viden fra Lexical Resources i kontekstuelle indlejringer til Lexical Substitution', 'bg': 'Интегриране на знания от лексикални ресурси в контекстуални вграждания за Lexical заместване', 'hr': 'LexSubCon: integracija znanja iz leksičkih resursa u „Kontekstne integracije za leksičku zamjenu', 'nl': 'LexSubCon: Kennis uit Lexical Resources integreren in contextuele embeddings voor Lexical Substitution', 'de': 'LexSubCon: Integration von Wissen aus Lexika-Ressourcen in kontextuelle Einbettungen für Lexika-Substitution', 'id': 'LexSubCon: Integrating Knowledge from Lexical Resources into  Contextual Embeddings for Lexical Substitution', 'ko': 'LexSubco: 어휘 자원의 지식을 언어 환경에 통합하여 어휘 교체를 진행한다', 'fa': 'LexSubCon: جمع کردن دانش از منابع سکسیکی به \u200cجایگزینی\u200cهای متوسط برای جایگزینی سکسی', 'tr': 'LexSubCon: Lexical Ressourcen Bilgi birleştirme', 'sw': 'paper size', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'SubCon:', 'sq': 'LexSubCon: Integrating Knowledge from Lexical Resources into  Contextual Embeddings for Lexical Substitution', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'LexSubCon: Lexical Resources Knowledge Integration into “ Contextual Embeddings for Lexical Substitution”', 'bn': 'LexSubCon: লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল সম্পদ থেকে সংযুক্ত তথ্য লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল অবসারণের জন্য বিদ্যমান বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্', 'bs': 'LexSubCon: integracija znanja iz leksičkih resursa u „Kontekstualne integracije za leksičku zamjenu”', 'ca': 'LexSubCon: Integrar el coneixement dels recursos lècsics en &lt;i&gt;Embeddings Contextual for Lexical Substitution&lt;/i&gt;', 'cs': 'LexSubCon: Integrace znalostí z Lexických zdrojů do kontextových vložení pro Lexickou nahrazování', 'et': 'LexSubCon: Lexikaalsete ressursside teadmiste integreerimine Lexikaalse asendamise kontekstipõimimisse', 'fi': 'LexSubCon: Lexical Resources -tietojen integrointi kontekstuaalisiin upotuksiin Lexical Korvaamista varten', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'LexSubCon: השתלב ידע משאבים לקסיים לתוך “ התקפים קונטקסטיים למחליפה לקסית', 'jv': 'LexSubcon: Bukak Kebebasan Kebebasan Suara Leksik nang  Kontextual Kebebasan kanggo Sistem Leksik', 'sk': 'LexSubCon: Vključevanje znanja iz leksičnih virov v kontekstne vdelave za Lexično nadomestitev', 'bo': 'LexSubCon: ཆ་འཕྲིན་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་ཤུགས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'In recent years, neural models have often outperformed rule-based and classic Machine Learning approaches in NLG. These classic approaches are now often disregarded, for example when new neural models are evaluated. We argue that they should not be overlooked, since, for some tasks, well-designed non-neural approaches achieve better performance than neural ones. In this paper, the task of generating referring expressions in linguistic context is used as an example. We examined two very different English datasets (WEBNLG and WSJ), and evaluated each algorithm using both automatic and human evaluations.Overall, the results of these evaluations suggest that rule-based systems with simple rule sets achieve on-par or better performance on both datasets compared to state-of-the-art neural REG systems. In the case of the more realistic dataset, WSJ, a machine learning-based system with well-designed linguistic features performed best. We hope that our work can encourage researchers to consider non-neural models in future.', 'ar': 'الاستبدال المعجمي هو مهمة توليد بدائل ذات مغزى لكلمة في سياق نصي معين. حققت نماذج تضمين الكلمات السياقية نتائج حديثة في مهمة الاستبدال المعجمي من خلال الاعتماد على المعلومات السياقية المستخرجة من الكلمة المستبدلة داخل الجملة. ومع ذلك ، فإن مثل هذه النماذج لا تأخذ في الاعتبار المعرفة المنظمة الموجودة في قواعد البيانات المعجمية الخارجية.\n\nنقدم لك LexSubCon ، وهو إطار عمل استبدال معجمي شامل يعتمد على نماذج التضمين السياقية التي يمكنها تحديد المرشحين البديلين عالي الدقة. يتم تحقيق ذلك من خلال الجمع بين المعلومات السياقية والمعرفة من الموارد المعجمية المنظمة. يتضمن منهجنا: (1) تقديم استراتيجية دمج جديدة لتضمين الكلمة المستهدفة من خلال الاستيفاء الخطي لزوج تضمين إدخال الهدف ومتوسط تضمين مرادفاته المحتملة ؛ (2) النظر في التشابه بين تضمين تعريف الجملة للكلمة المستهدفة ومرشحيها المقترحين ؛ و (3) حساب تأثير كل استبدال على دلالات الجملة من خلال نموذج تشابه الجملة الدقيق. تُظهر تجاربنا أن LexSubCon يتفوق في الأداء على أحدث الأساليب السابقة بنسبة 2٪ على الأقل على جميع مقاييس الاستبدال المعجمية الرسمية في مجموعات البيانات المعيارية LS07 و CoInCo التي تُستخدم على نطاق واسع لمهام الاستبدال المعجمي.', 'pt': 'A substituição lexical é a tarefa de gerar substitutos significativos para uma palavra em um determinado contexto textual. Os modelos de incorporação de palavras contextuais alcançaram resultados de última geração na tarefa de substituição lexical, contando com informações contextuais extraídas da palavra substituída dentro da frase. No entanto, tais modelos não levam em conta o conhecimento estruturado que existe em bancos de dados lexicais externos.\n\nApresentamos o LexSubCon, uma estrutura de substituição lexical de ponta a ponta baseada em modelos de incorporação contextual que podem identificar candidatos substitutos altamente precisos. Isso é alcançado combinando informações contextuais com o conhecimento de recursos lexicais estruturados. Nossa abordagem envolve: (i) a introdução de uma nova estratégia de incorporação de mistura na incorporação da palavra-alvo através da interpolação linear do par de incorporação de entrada de destino e da incorporação média de seus prováveis sinônimos; (ii) considerando a similaridade dos encaixes de definição de sentença da palavra alvo e seus candidatos propostos; e, (iii) calcular o efeito de cada substituição na semântica da sentença por meio de um modelo de similaridade de sentença afinado. Nossos experimentos mostram que o LexSubCon supera os métodos de última geração anteriores em pelo menos 2% em relação a todas as métricas oficiais de substituição lexical nos conjuntos de dados de referência LS07 e CoInCo que são amplamente usados para tarefas de substituição lexical.', 'es': 'La sustitución léxica es la tarea de generar sustitutos significativos para una palabra en un contexto textual dado. Los modelos de incrustación de palabras contextuales han logrado resultados de vanguardia en la tarea de sustitución léxica al basarse en la información contextual extraída de la palabra reemplazada dentro de la oración. Sin embargo, estos modelos no tienen en cuenta los conocimientos estructurados que existen en las bases de datos léxicas externas.\n\nPresentamos LexSubCon, un marco de sustitución léxica de extremo a extremo basado en modelos de incrustación contextual que pueden identificar candidatos sustitutos altamente precisos. Esto se logra combinando la información contextual con el conocimiento de recursos léxicos estructurados. Nuestro enfoque implica: (i) introducir una estrategia novedosa de integración de mezcla para la incrustación de la palabra objetivo a través de la interpolación lineal del par de incrustación de entrada objetivo y la incrustación promedio de sus sinónimos probables; (ii) considerar la similitud de las incrustaciones de definición de oración de la palabra objetivo y sus candidatos propuestos, y iii) calcular el efecto de cada sustitución en la semántica de la oración mediante un modelo de similitud de oraciones afinado. Nuestros experimentos muestran que LexSubCon supera al menos un 2% a los métodos anteriores de última generación sobre todas las métricas oficiales de sustitución léxica en los conjuntos de datos de referencia LS07 y CoinCo que se utilizan ampliamente para tareas de sustitución léxica.', 'fr': "La substitution lexicale consiste à générer des substituts significatifs pour un mot dans un contexte textuel donné. Les modèles d'intégration de mots contextuels ont obtenu des résultats de pointe dans la tâche de substitution lexicale en s'appuyant sur des informations contextuelles extraites du mot remplacé dans la phrase. Toutefois, ces modèles ne tiennent pas compte des connaissances structurées qui existent dans les bases de données lexicales externes.\n\nNous présentons LexSubCon, un cadre de substitution lexicale de bout en bout basé sur des modèles d'intégration contextuels qui peuvent identifier des candidats de substitution très précis. Ceci est réalisé en combinant des informations contextuelles avec des connaissances issues de ressources lexicales structurées. Notre approche consiste à\xa0: (i) introduire une nouvelle stratégie d'intégration de confusion dans l'intégration du mot cible en interpolant linéairement la paire d'intégration d'entrée cible et l'intégration moyenne de ses synonymes probables\xa0; (ii) prendre en compte la similitude des intégrations de définition de phrase du mot cible et ses candidats proposés\xa0; et iii calculer l'effet de chaque substitution sur la sémantique de la phrase au moyen d'un modèle de similarité de phrase affiné. Nos expériences montrent que LexSubCon surpasse les méthodes de pointe précédentes d'au moins 2\xa0% par rapport à toutes les métriques de substitution lexicale officielles sur les ensembles de données de référence LS07 et CoinCo largement utilisés pour les tâches de substitution lexicale.", 'ja': '単語置換は、与えられたテキストコンテキスト内の単語の有意義な置換を生成するタスクです。 文脈単語埋め込みモデルは、文の中の置換された単語から抽出された文脈情報に依存することによって、語彙置換タスクで最先端の結果を達成しています。 しかし、そのようなモデルは、外部の辞書データベースに存在する構造化された知識を考慮していない。\n\nLexSubConは、高精度の代替候補を特定できるコンテキスト埋め込みモデルに基づくエンドツーエンドの辞書代替フレームワークです。 これは、文脈情報と構造化された語彙リソースからの知識を組み合わせることによって達成される。 私たちのアプローチは、（ ｉ ）ターゲット入力埋め込みのペアとその可能性の高い同義語の平均埋め込みを線形補間することによって、ターゲット単語の埋め込みに新規のミックスアップ埋め込み戦略を導入すること、（ ｉ ｉ ）ターゲット単語とその提案された候補の文定義埋め込みの類似性を考慮すること、および（ ｉｉｉ ）微調整された文の類似性モデルを通じて、文の意味論における各置換の効果を計算することを含む。 当社の実験によると、LexSubConは、LS 07およびCoInCoベンチマークデータセット上のすべての公式の語彙置換指標に対して、従来の最先端の方法を少なくとも2%上回っています。これは、語彙置換タスクに広く使用されています。', 'zh': '词法代在给定文上下文为单词成义代项之任。 上下文词嵌模以句易单词取上下文息,于词汇为最先进。 然不虑外词汇数据库之结构化知也。\n\n引入 LexSubCon,此一基上下文嵌模之端词汇代框架,可以识高正之代候选者。 此将上下文信息与结构化词汇资源相合也。 其法:(i)以线性插值输嵌之同义词,为向词者引入一新混合嵌策。 (ii) 考慮至目標單詞及其擬議候選詞句定義嵌相似性。 且(iii)以微句相似性计每代语义。 臣等实验明,LexSubCon性比LS07、CoInCo准数集上所有官方词汇代指标至少2%,博施词汇代。', 'ru': 'Лексическая подстановка - это задача генерации значимых подстановок слова в данном текстовом контексте. Контекстные модели встраивания слов достигли самых современных результатов в задаче лексической замены, опираясь на контекстную информацию, извлеченную из замененного слова в предложении. Однако такие модели не учитывают структурированные знания, которые существуют во внешних лексических базах данных.\n\nМы представляем LexSubCon, сквозной фреймворк лексической замены, основанный на контекстных моделях встраивания, которые могут идентифицировать высокоточных кандидатов-заменителей. Это достигается путем сочетания контекстуальной информации со знаниями из структурированных лексических ресурсов. Наш подход включает в себя: (i) введение новой стратегии вложения путаницы в вложение целевого слова посредством линейной интерполяции пары вложений целевого ввода и среднего вложения его вероятных синонимов; (ii)  рассмотрение сходства вложений определения предложения целевого слова и его предлагаемых кандидатов; и (iii) вычисление влияния каждой замены на семантику предложения с помощью тонкой модели сходства предложения. Наши эксперименты показывают, что LexSubCon превосходит предыдущие современные методы по меньшей мере на 2% по всем официальным метрикам лексической подстановки на наборах данных сравнения LS07  и CoInCo, которые широко используются для задач лексической подстановки.', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकल प्रतिस्थापन किसी दिए गए पाठ्य संदर्भ में किसी शब्द के लिए सार्थक विकल्प उत्पन्न करने का कार्य है। प्रासंगिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल ने वाक्य के भीतर प्रतिस्थापित शब्द से निकाली गई प्रासंगिक जानकारी पर भरोसा करके लेक्सिकल प्रतिस्थापन कार्य में अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं। हालांकि, ऐसे मॉडल संरचित ज्ञान को ध्यान में नहीं रखते हैं जो बाहरी लेक्सिकल डेटाबेस में मौजूद है।\n\nहम LexSubCon, प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के आधार पर एक एंड-टू-एंड लेक्सिकल प्रतिस्थापन ढांचे का परिचय देते हैं जो अत्यधिक सटीक स्थानापन्न उम्मीदवारों की पहचान कर सकते हैं। यह संरचित लेक्सिकल संसाधनों से ज्ञान के साथ प्रासंगिक जानकारी के संयोजन से प्राप्त किया जाता है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण में शामिल है: (i) लक्ष्य इनपुट एम्बेडिंग की जोड़ी को रैखिक रूप से इंटरपोल करने और इसके संभावित पर्यायवाची शब्दों के औसत एम्बेडिंग के माध्यम से लक्ष्य शब्द के एम्बेडिंग के लिए एक उपन्यास मिक्स-अप एम्बेडिंग रणनीति पेश करना; (ii) लक्ष्य शब्द और इसके प्रस्तावित उम्मीदवारों के वाक्य-परिभाषा एम्बेडिंग की समानता पर विचार करना; और, (iii) एक ठीक-ठाक वाक्य समानता मॉडल के माध्यम से वाक्य के शब्दार्थ पर प्रत्येक प्रतिस्थापन के प्रभाव की गणना करना। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि LexSubCon LS07 और CoInCo बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर सभी आधिकारिक लेक्सिकल प्रतिस्थापन मैट्रिक्स पर कम से कम 2% द्वारा पिछले अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है जो व्यापक रूप से लेक्सिकल प्रतिस्थापन कार्यों के लिए उपयोग किए जाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is éard is ionadú foclóireachta ann ná ionadaí bríocha a ghiniúint d’fhocal i gcomhthéacs téacs ar leith. Tá torthaí úrscothacha bainte amach ag samhlacha leabú focal comhthéacsúla sa tasc ionadaíochta foclóireachta trí bheith ag brath ar fhaisnéis chomhthéacsúil a bhaintear as an bhfocal athsholáthair laistigh den abairt. Mar sin féin, ní chuireann samhlacha den sórt sin san áireamh eolas struchtúrtha atá i mbunachair sonraí foclóireachta seachtracha.\n\nTugaimid isteach LexSubCon, creat ionadach foclóireachta ó cheann go ceann atá bunaithe ar mhúnlaí leabú comhthéacsúla lenar féidir iarrthóirí ionaid atá thar a bheith cruinn a shainaithint. Baintear é seo amach trí fhaisnéis chomhthéacsúil a chomhcheangal le heolas ó acmhainní struchtúrtha foclóireachta. Is éard atá i gceist lenár gcur chuige: (i) straitéis leabú meascán úrnua a thabhairt isteach i leabú an spriocfhocail trí leabú péire an sprioc-ionchuir a idirshuíomh go líneach agus trí mheán leabú na gcomhchiallaigh dóchúla; (ii) breithniú a dhéanamh ar chosúlacht leabú abairt-mhínithe an spriocfhocail agus na hiarrthóirí atá beartaithe dó; agus, (iii) éifeacht gach ionadaíochta ar shéimeantaic na habairte a ríomh trí mhúnla cosúlachta abairtí mionchoigeartaithe. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn LexSubCon modhanna úrscothacha roimhe seo 2% ar a laghad i gcomparáid leis na méadrachtaí oifigiúla ionadaíochta foclóireachta ar thacair sonraí tagarmhairc LS07 agus CoInCo a úsáidtear go forleathan le haghaidh tascanna ionadaíochta foclóireachta.', 'el': 'Η Lexical substitution είναι το καθήκον της δημιουργίας ουσιαστικών υποκατάστατων μιας λέξης σε ένα δεδομένο κείμενο πλαίσιο. Τα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων στο πλαίσιο έχουν επιτύχει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στην εργασία υποκατάστασης λεξικών βασιζόμενοι σε πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος που εξάγονται από τη λέξη που αντικαθίσταται μέσα στην πρόταση. Ωστόσο, τέτοια μοντέλα δεν λαμβάνουν υπόψη δομημένη γνώση που υπάρχει σε εξωτερικές λεξικές βάσεις δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'A lexikai helyettesítés az a feladat, hogy egy adott szövegkörnyezetben értelmes helyettesítőket hozzon létre. A kontextuális szóbeágyazási modellek korszerű eredményeket értek el a lexikális helyettesítési feladatban azáltal, hogy a mondatban belül kicserélt szóból kinyert kontextuális információkra támaszkodnak. Az ilyen modellek azonban nem veszik figyelembe a külső lexikai adatbázisokban létező strukturált ismereteket.', 'it': "La sostituzione lessicale è il compito di generare sostituti significativi per una parola in un dato contesto testuale. I modelli di incorporazione di parole contestuali hanno ottenuto risultati all'avanguardia nel compito di sostituzione lessicale facendo affidamento su informazioni contestuali estratte dalla parola sostituita all'interno della frase. Tuttavia, tali modelli non tengono conto delle conoscenze strutturate esistenti in banche dati lessicali esterne.", 'lt': 'Leksinis pakeitimas yra užduotis kurti reikšmingus žodžio pakeitimus tam tikru tekstiniu kontekstu. Contextual word embedding models have achieved state-of-the-art results in the lexical substitution task by relying on contextual information extracted from the replaced word within the sentence.  Tačiau tokiuose modeliuose neatsižvelgiama į struktūrizuotas žinias, kurios egzistuoja išorinėse leksinėse duomenų bazėse.', 'kk': 'Лексикалық алмастыру - келтірілген мәтін контекстінде сөзді маңызды алмастыру тапсырмасы. Контексті сөздерді ендіру үлгілері лексикалық алмастыру тапсырмасының күйін жеткізді. Сөздің алмастырылған сөзден келтірілген контексті мәліметіне сәйкес келеді. Бірақ бұл үлгілер сыртқы лексикалық деректер қорларында бар құрылған білімдерді есептеп алмайды.', 'ka': 'Lexical substitution is the task of generating meaningful substitutes for a word in a given text context. კონტექსტური სიტყვის შეყვარებული მოდელების შესაძლებლობა ლექსიკალური შეცვლელების რაოდენობაში მიიღეთ, რომელიც კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის შეცვლელი სიტყვიდან გამოყენებული სიტყ მაგრამ ასეთი მოდელები არ აღმოჩნდება სტრუქტურული მეცნიერება, რომელიც გარეშე ლექსიკალური ბაზაში არსებობს.', 'ms': 'Penggantian leksikal adalah tugas untuk menghasilkan pengganti bermakna bagi perkataan dalam konteks teks tertentu. Model penyembelihan perkataan konteks telah mencapai keputusan-state-of-the-art dalam tugas penggantian leksikal dengan bergantung pada maklumat konteks yang diekstrak dari perkataan yang diganti dalam kalimat. Namun, model tersebut tidak mempertimbangkan pengetahuan struktur yang wujud dalam pangkalan data lexik luaran.', 'mt': 'Is-sostituzzjoni lexika hija l-kompitu li jiġu ġġenerati sostituti sinifikanti għal kelma f’kuntest testwali partikolari. Il-mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem kuntestwali kisbu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fil-kompitu ta’ sostituzzjoni lexikali billi ddependew fuq informazzjoni kuntestwali estratta mill-kelma sostitwita fi ħdan is-sentenza. However, such models do not take into account structured knowledge that exists in external lexical databases.', 'mn': 'Лексик орлуулалт бол өгөгдсөн текстуралд утгатай орлуулалт бий болгох үйл явц юм. Сүүлийн үг орлуулах үг загварууд үг орлуулсан үг доторх орлуулсан үгээс гарсан үг дээр орлуулсан үг дээр орлуулсан үг дээр орлуулсан үг дээр итгэлтэй болсон. Гэвч ийм загварууд гадаад хэлний өгөгдлийн санд байгаа бүтэц мэдлэгтэй мэдлэгтэй холбоотой.', 'mk': 'Лексикалната замена е задачата за генерирање значајни замени за збор во одреден текстуален контекст. Контекстуалните модели за вградување на зборови постигнаа најнови резултати во лексикалната задача за замена со доверба на контекстуални информации извадени од заменетиот збор во реченицата. However, such models do not take into account structured knowledge that exists in external lexical databases.', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d പകര്\u200dപ്പ് നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റ്റലില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്കിന് അര്\u200dത്ഥമായ മാറ്റിന വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പകര്\u200dത്തിയ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മാറ്റിയ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന വിവരം വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ലെക് എങ്കിലും പുറത്തുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാബേസില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d അക്കൌണ്ടിങ്ങോട', 'no': 'Leksykisk erstatning er oppgåva for å laga meaningfulle erstatningar for eit ord i eit gitt tekstkontekst. Kontekst- ordinnbyggingsmodeller har oppnådd status- of- the- art resultatet i den leksiske substitusjonsoppgåva ved å forstå på kontekst- informasjon utpakka frå ordet erstatta i setninga. Desse modeller gjer imidlertid ikkje i konto strukturerte kunnskap som finst i eksterne leksiske databaser.', 'ro': 'Înlocuirea lexicală este sarcina de a genera substituți semnificativi pentru un cuvânt într-un context textual dat. Modelele contextuale de încorporare a cuvintelor au obținut rezultate de ultimă generație în sarcina de substituție lexicală bazându-se pe informații contextuale extrase din cuvântul înlocuit din propoziție. Cu toate acestea, astfel de modele nu iau în considerare cunoștințele structurate care există în bazele de date lexicale externe.', 'sr': 'Leksička zamjena je zadatak stvaranja značajnih zamjena za riječ u određenom tekstualnom kontekstu. Kontekstualni modeli uključenih reči ostvarili su rezultate stanja umjetnosti u zadatku leksičke zamjene, oslanjajući se na kontekstualne informacije izvedene iz zamjene reči u rečenici. Međutim, takvi modeli ne uzimaju u obzir strukturirano znanje koje postoje u vanjskim leksičkim bazama podataka.', 'pl': 'Podstawienie leksykalne to zadanie generowania znaczących substytutów słowa w danym kontekście tekstowym. Kontekstowe modele osadzania słów osiągnęły najnowocześniejsze wyniki w zadaniu zastępowania leksykalnego poprzez opieranie się na informacjach kontekstowych uzyskanych z zastąpionego słowa w zdaniu. Takie modele nie uwzględniają jednak strukturyzowanej wiedzy istniejącej w zewnętrznych bazach leksykalnych.', 'so': 'Isbedelka Leksikal waa shaqada ku sameynta bedelka waxyaabaha leh ee ku qoran qoraalka. Contextual word embedding models have achieved state-of-the-art results in the lexical substitution task by relying on contextual information extracted from the replaced word within the sentence.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalooyinkaas ma xisaabtamaan aqoonta dhisan oo ku jira shabakada dibadda ee la xiriira.', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකාල් වෙනස්ථානය තමයි දෙන්න පාළුවන් සංවේදනයේ වචනයක් වෙනුවෙන් තේරුම් වෙනුවෙන් වැඩක්. සාමාන්\u200dය වචනය සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවක් මොඩේල්ස් එකේ state-of-the-art ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d නමුත්, එහෙම විදියට මොඩේල්ස් එක්ක බාහ්ය ලෙක්සිකාල් දත්ත බේස් එක්ක තියෙන්නේ නැහැ.', 'sv': 'Lexisk substitution är uppgiften att skapa meningsfulla substitutioner för ett ord i ett givet textsammanhang. Kontextuella ordinbäddningsmodeller har uppnått toppmoderna resultat i den lexikala substitutionsuppgiften genom att förlita sig på kontextuell information extraherad från det ersatta ordet i meningen. Sådana modeller tar dock inte hänsyn till strukturerad kunskap som finns i externa lexikala databaser.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட நிரல் சூழலில் ஒரு வார்த்தைக்கு அர்த்தமான மாற்றங்களை உருவாக்கும் செயல். உள்ளமைப்பு சொல் உள்ளடக்க மாதிரிகள் மாதிரிகளின் நிலை- கலை மாற்றும் செயலின் முடிவுகளை பெற்று வாக்கியத்திற்குள் மாற்றிய வார்த்தையி However, such models do not take into account structured knowledge that exists in external lexical databases.', 'ur': "Lexical substitution is the task of generating meaningful substitutes for a word in a given text context. متوسط کلمات ابڈینگ نمڈلوں کی حالت-of-the-art کے نتیجے لکسیکل بدلنے کے کام میں پہنچ گئے ہیں، یعنی متوسط معلومات پر بھروسہ کریں جو کلمات کے بدلے کلمات سے نکالی جاتی ہے. However, such models don't take into account structured knowledge that exists in external lexical databases.", 'uz': 'Name Name Ammo, bu modellar tashqi leksikal maʼlumot bazalarida maʼlumot hisoblanmaydi.', 'vi': 'Sự thay đổi ngôn ngữ là nhiệm vụ tạo ra thay thế cho một từ có ý nghĩa trong một ngữ cảnh cụ thể. Kiểu ghép chữ liên tiếp đã đạt được kết quả hiện đại trong nhiệm vụ thay đổi từ bằng cách dựa vào các thông tin ngữ cảnh lấy ra từ từ từ đã thay thế trong từ. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình này không tính đến kiến thức có cấu trúc trong cơ sở dữ liệu ngôn ngữ bên ngoài.', 'bg': 'Лексикалното заместване е задачата да се генерират смислени заместители на дадена дума в даден текстов контекст. Моделите за вграждане на контекстни думи постигат най-съвременни резултати в задачата за лексикално заместване, като разчитат на контекстуална информация, извлечена от заменената дума в изречението. Такива модели обаче не отчитат структурираните знания, които съществуват във външните лексикални бази данни.', 'nl': 'Lexische substitutie is de taak van het genereren van betekenisvolle substituties voor een woord in een bepaalde tekstcontext. Contextuele woordinbeddingsmodellen hebben state-of-the-art resultaten bereikt in de lexicale substitutietaak door te vertrouwen op contextuele informatie die uit het vervangen woord in de zin wordt gehaald. Dergelijke modellen houden echter geen rekening met gestructureerde kennis die bestaat in externe lexicale databases.', 'da': 'Lexisk substitution er opgaven at generere meningsfulde erstatninger for et ord i en given tekstkontekst. Kontekstuelle ordindlejringsmodeller har opnået state-of-the-art resultater i den leksikalske substitutionsopgave ved at stole på kontekstuel information udvundet fra det erstattede ord i sætningen. Sådanne modeller tager dog ikke hensyn til struktureret viden, der findes i eksterne leksikalsdatabaser.', 'hr': 'Leksička zamjena je zadatak stvaranja značajnih zamjena riječi u određenom tekstualnom kontekstu. Kontekstni modeli uključujući riječi postigli su rezultate stanja umjetnosti u zadatku leksičke zamjene oslanjajući se na contextualne informacije izvučene iz zamjene riječi u rečenici. Međutim, takvi modeli ne uzimaju u obzir strukturirano znanje koje postoje u vanjskim leksičkim bazama podataka.', 'de': 'Lexikale Substitution ist die Aufgabe, sinnvolle Substitutionen für ein Wort in einem gegebenen textlichen Kontext zu generieren. Kontextbasierte Worteinbettungsmodelle haben bei der lexikalischen Substitutionsaufgabe modernste Ergebnisse erzielt, indem sie sich auf Kontextinformationen stützen, die aus dem ersetzten Wort innerhalb des Satzes extrahiert wurden. Solche Modelle berücksichtigen jedoch kein strukturiertes Wissen, das in externen lexikalischen Datenbanken vorhanden ist.', 'id': 'Penggantian Lexik adalah tugas untuk menghasilkan pengganti yang berarti untuk sebuah kata dalam konteks teks tertentu. Model penyampilan kata kontekstual telah mencapai hasil state-of-the-art dalam tugas penggantian leksik dengan bergantung pada informasi kontekstual yang diekstraksi dari kata yang diganti dalam kalimat. Namun, model tersebut tidak mempertimbangkan pengetahuan struktur yang ada di basis data lexik luar.', 'ko': '어휘 교체는 주어진 텍스트의 언어 환경에서 한 단어에 의미 있는 교체어를 생성하는 임무이다.어경어 삽입 모델은 문장에서 교체된 단어에서 추출한 어경 정보에 의존하여 어휘 교체 임무에서 최신 성과를 얻었다.그러나 이런 모델은 외부 어휘 데이터베이스에 존재하는 구조화된 지식을 고려하지 않았다.', 'fa': 'جایگزینی درمانی کار تولید جایگزینی معنی برای یک کلمه در یک محیط متن داده است. مدلهای جایگزینی کلمه متوسط به حالت هنر نتیجه\u200cهای جایگزینی زبان را به دست آورده\u200cاند با توجه به اطلاعات متوسط که از کلمه جایگزینی در جمله خارج شده است. ولی این مدلها به حساب علمی ساخته شده که در پایگاه های داده های زبانی خارجی وجود دارد، حساب نمی کنند.', 'sw': 'Ubadilishaji wa Lexico ni jukumu la kutengeneza mabadiliko yenye maana kwa neno katika muktadha ulio pewa. Mradi wa maneno ya ndani umefanikiwa hali ya sanaa na matokeo ya kazi ya mabadiliko ya lexico kwa kutegemea taarifa za kisasa zilizotolewa kutoka kwenye neno lililobadilishwa ndani ya hukumu hiyo. Hata hivyo, mifano kama hizi haichukulii maarifa yaliyotengenezwa na taarifa za nje za lexico.', 'tr': 'Leksik ýerine ýetirme, berilen metin kontekstinde maýyp ýerleşleri döretmek üçin zady. Metin sözleri ekleýän modlerden soňra metin edilen sözleriň içinden çekilýän senediň durumyny tapyldy. Ýöne şol nusgalar daşarydaky lexikalar databaselerinde bar ýaly strukturly bilgilere seretmeýär.', 'af': 'Name Konteksual woord inbetering modele het state-of-the-art resultate in die leksiese substitusie taak bereik deur te verlaat op kontekslike inligting uitgevoer van die vervangde woord binne die seting. Maar sodanige modele neem nie in rekening structureerde kennis wat bestaan in eksterne leksiese databasis nie.', 'sq': 'Zëvendësimi leksikal është detyra e krijimit të zëvendësimeve të kuptueshme për një fjalë në një kontekst tekstual të caktuar. Modelet kontekstuale të përfshirjes së fjalëve kanë arritur rezultate më të larta në detyrën e zëvendësimit lexik duke u mbështetur në informacionin kontekstual të nxjerrë nga fjala e zëvendësuar brenda fjalës. Megjithatë, modelet e tilla nuk marrin parasysh njohuritë e strukturuara që ekzistojnë në bazat e dhënave të jashtme lexike.', 'am': 'Lexical substitution is the task to create meaningful substitutes for words in a given textual context. የግንኙነት ቃላት አካባቢ ሞዴላዎች የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት አግኝተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን እንደዚህ ዓይነቶች ውጭ የሊክሲካዊ ዳታቤቶች ውስጥ ያሉትን እውቀት አያስቡም፡፡', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկական փոխարինումը նշանակալի փոխարիներ ստեղծելն է որոշ տեքստային կոնտեքստում: Կոնտեքստային բառերի ներդրման մոդելները հասել են բարձրագույն արդյունքներին լեքսիկական փոխարինման խնդրում, հիմնվելով նախադասության փոխարինված բառից ստացված կոնտեքստային տեղեկատվության վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս մոդելները չեն հաշվի առնում արտաքին լեքսիկական տվյալների կառուցվածքային գիտելիքները:', 'az': 'Üstünlük əvəzində yazılı bir söz üçün anlamlı əvəzini yaratmaq məqsədilədir. Sözünün əvəz edilmiş sözdən çıxarılan müxtəlif məlumatlarına təvəkkül edib, əlaqə edilən məlumatların məlumatlarına təvəkkül etdi. Halbuki bu modellər dış dil verilənlərdə olduğu strukturlu bilgi hesablamazlar.', 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল বিনিময় হচ্ছে একটি প্রদত্ত টেক্সুয়াল প্রেক্ষেত্রে একটি শব্দের জন্য অর্থহীন বিনিময়ের ক বিদ্যমান শব্দের প্রতিষ্ঠান মোডেল লেক্সিক্যাল বিনিময়ের কাজের ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে বাক্যের মধ্যে থেকে প্রতিস্থাপন করা শব্দের প্রতিস্থাপনের However, such models do not take into account structured knowledge that exists in external lexical databases.', 'bs': 'Leksička zamjena je zadatak stvaranja značajnih zamjena za riječ u određenom tekstualnom kontekstu. Kontekstualni modeli uključenih riječi ostvarili su rezultate stanja umjetnosti u zadatku leksičke zamjene, oslanjajući se na kontekstualne informacije izvučene iz zamjene riječi u rečenici. Međutim, takvi modeli ne uzimaju u obzir strukturirano znanje koje postoje u vanjskim leksičkim bazama podataka.', 'cs': 'Lexická substituce je úkolem generovat smysluplné náhrady slova v daném textovém kontextu. Kontextové modely vkládání slov dosáhly nejmodernějších výsledků v lexikální substituci tím, že spoléhaly na kontextové informace extrahované z nahrazeného slova ve větě. Tyto modely však nezohledňují strukturované znalosti existující v externích lexikálních databázích.', 'ca': 'La substitució lèxica és la tasca de generar substitucions significatius per a una paraula en un context textual determinat. Contextual word embedding models have achieved state-of-the-art results in the lexical substitution task by relying on contextual information extracted from the replaced word within the sentence.  However, such models do not take into account structured knowledge that exists in external lexical databases.', 'et': 'Lexikaalne asendamine on ülesanne luua tähenduslikke asendusi sõnale antud tekstikontekstis. Kontekstsõnade manustamise mudelid on saavutanud sõnastiku asendamise ülesandes kaasaegseid tulemusi, tuginedes lauses asendatud sõnast saadud kontekstiteabele. Sellised mudelid ei võta siiski arvesse struktureeritud teadmisi, mis eksisteerivad välistes leksikaalsetes andmebaasides.', 'fi': 'Lexical substitution on tehtävä luoda merkityksellisiä korvaajia sanalle tietyssä tekstikontekstissa. Kontekstuaaliset sanaupotusmallit ovat saavuttaneet viimeisimpiä tuloksia sanaston korvaamisessa tukeutumalla lauseessa korvatusta sanasta poimittuun kontekstitietoon. Tällaisissa malleissa ei kuitenkaan oteta huomioon ulkoisissa sanastotietokannoissa olevaa jäsenneltyä tietoa.', 'jv': 'Wurung context-action Nanging, yo sampeyan model kuwi ora dikondisikno ning sabanjur-sabanjur sing dumadhi karo datadir-sabanjuré', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion @ action: button A lokacin da, waɗannan misalin ba su ƙayyade wani ilmi wanda ke da ke cikin bango masu ƙarƙashin leksisi ba.', 'he': 'החליפה לקסית היא המשימה לייצור מחליפים משמעותיים למילה בקשר טקסטלי מסוים. דוגמני מילים קונטקסטיים השיגו תוצאות חדשות במשימת החליפה הלקסית על ידי הסמוך על מידע קונטקסטי שנוצא מהמילה המחליפה בתוך המשפט. עם זאת, דוגמנים כאלה לא לוקחים בחשבון ידע מבוסס שקיים בבסיסי נתונים לקסיים חיצוניים.', 'sk': 'Lexična nadomestitev je naloga ustvarjanja smiselnih nadomestkov za besedo v danem besedilnem kontekstu. Modeli vključevanja besed v kontekst so dosegli najsodobnejše rezultate pri opravilu leksikalne substitucije z opiranjem na kontekstualne informacije, pridobljene iz nadomeščene besede v stavku. Vendar takšni modeli ne upoštevajo strukturiranega znanja, ki obstaja v zunanjih leksikalnih zbirkah podatkov.', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་ཚབ་བཅུག་ནི་ཚིག་ཡི་གེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཚབ Contextual word embedding models have achieved state-of-the-art results in the lexical substitution task by relying on contextual information extracted from the replaced word in the sentence. ཡིན་ནའང་། དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདིའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་རིགས་སྟོན་མེད།'}
{'en': 'Predicate-Argument Based Bi-Encoder for Paraphrase Identification', 'ar': 'فكر قبل أن تتحدث: التوليد الصريح للمعرفة الضمنية لتوليد الاستجابة', 'fr': 'Réfléchissez avant de parler\xa0: générer explicitement des connaissances implicites de bon sens pour la génération de réponses', 'es': 'Piense antes de hablar: Generación explícita de conocimiento de sentido común implícito para la generación de respuestas', 'pt': 'Pense Antes de Falar: Gerando Explicitamente Conhecimento Implícito de Senso Comum para Geração de Respostas', 'zh': '言前先思:显式生隐性常识,以应生成', 'ja': '発言する前に考える：レスポンス生成のための暗黙のコモンセンス知識を明示的に生成する', 'ru': 'Подумайте, прежде чем говорить: явно генерируя неявное знание здравого смысла для генерации ответов', 'hi': 'बोलने से पहले सोचें: प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी के लिए स्पष्ट रूप से अंतर्निहित कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान उत्पन्न करना', 'ga': 'Smaoinigh Sula Labhraíonn Tú: Ag Giniúint go Sonrach Eolas Intuigthe Commonsense chun Freagra a Ghiniúint', 'hu': 'Gondolkozz mielőtt beszélsz: Implicit Commonsense Knowledge generálása a válasz generálásához', 'el': 'Σκέψου πριν μιλήσεις: Η ρητή δημιουργία έμμεσης γνώσης κοινής λογικής για τη δημιουργία απαντήσεων', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Pensare prima di parlare: Generare esplicitamente conoscenze implicite per la generazione di risposte', 'lt': 'Pamąstykite prieš kalbėdami: aiškiai sukuriamos implicitinės bendros žinios apie atsako sukūrimą', 'mk': 'Размислете пред да зборувате: јасно генерирање имплицитно заедничко знаење за генерација на одговор', 'ms': 'Fikirkan Sebelum Anda bercakap: Menjana secara jelas Pengetahuan Komunis Implik untuk Menjana Balasan', 'kk': 'Сөйлесу алдында ойлаңыз: Жауап жасау үшін тәжірибелі Commonsense білімін құру', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് ചിന്തിക്കുക: ഉത്തരവ് ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എക്സ്ലിക്', 'mt': 'Think Before You Speak: Explicitly Generating Implicit Commonsense Knowledge for Response Generation', 'no': 'Tenk før du snakkar: Eksplicit lagar implisitt kommunikasjonskvitning for oppretting av svar', 'mn': 'Үйлэхээс өмнө бодоод үз: Хариу хариу үйлдвэрлэлийн мэдлэгийг тодорхой бий болгож байна.', 'ro': 'Gândiți-vă înainte de a vorbi: Generarea explicită a cunoștințelor implicite de bun simț pentru generarea de răspuns', 'pl': 'Pomyśl zanim zaczniesz mówić: Wyraźne generowanie domyślnej wiedzy o powszechnym sensie dla generowania reakcji', 'sr': 'Razmišljaj pre nego što govoriš: Eksplicitno stvaranje znanja o javnosti za generaciju odgovora', 'sv': 'Tänk innan du talar: Explicit generera implicit allmännyttig kunskap för responsgenerering', 'so': 'Ka fikir ka hor ka hadlidda: Explicitly Creating Implicit Knowledge of Response Generation', 'ta': 'பேசுவதற்கு முன் சிந்தித்துப் பார்', 'si': 'ඔබ කතා කරන්න කලින් හිතන්න: ප්\u200dරතිචාරිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සම්බන්ධ දන්න', 'ur': 'آپ بات کرنے سے پہلے سوچ کریں: جواب دینے کے لئے مفصل کی کمپنس کا علم پیدا کرتا ہے', 'uz': '@ info', 'vi': 'Hãy nghĩ trước khi bạn nói: Phát triển rõ khả năng hiểu biết tiềm năng để tạo phản ứng.', 'bg': 'Помислете, преди да говорите: изрично генериране на имплицитно общоприето знание за генериране на отговор', 'nl': 'Denk na voordat je spreekt: expliciet impliciete kennis genereren voor het genereren van reacties', 'da': 'Tænk før du taler: Udtrykkeligt generere implicit almindelig viden til responsgenerering', 'hr': 'Razmišljajte prije nego što govorite: Eksplicitno stvaranje znanja o javnosti za generaciju odgovora', 'de': 'Denken Sie, bevor Sie sprechen: Implizite Generierung von Commonsense-Wissen für die Generierung von Reaktionen', 'id': 'Pikirkan Sebelum Anda Bicara: Menghasilkan Jelas Pengetahuan Komunis Implik untuk Generasi Respon', 'ko': '심사숙고한 후 행: 현식 생성은 생성에 호응하는 은식 상식 지식에 사용된다', 'fa': 'قبل از اینکه صحبت کنید فکر کنید: با توجه به تولید علم عمومی برای نسل جواب', 'sw': 'Think Before You Speak: Explicitly Generating Implicit Commonsense Knowledge for Response Generation', 'tr': 'Gürlemezden öňinçä pikir et: Gerçekleri döredip esasy Commonsense Bilgi Bejer', 'af': 'Dink voor U spreek: Ekspliteit Genereer Implicite Commonsense kennis vir Antwoord Genereer', 'sq': 'Mendoni para se të flisni: Duke krijuar shprehësisht njohuri të përbashkët implicitet për gjenerimin e përgjigjes', 'am': 'Explicitly Generating Implicit Commons Knowledge for Response Generation', 'az': 'Sözsüz danışmadan əvvəl düşünün: cavab vermək üçün imkansız Commonsense Bilgi yaratmaq', 'bn': 'আপনি কথা বলার পূর্বে চিন্তা করুন: প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্মের জন্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্য তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Մտածեք մինչև խոսելը. արձագանքի ստեղծման համար բացահայտորեն ստեղծելը նշանակալի համայնքային գիտելիքներ', 'bs': 'Razmišljajte prije nego što govorite: Eksplicitno stvaranje znanja o javnosti za generaciju odgovora', 'cs': 'Přemýšlejte před tím, než promluvíte: Explicitní generování implicitních znalostí obecného rozumu pro generování reakcí', 'ca': 'Penseu abans de parlar: generar expressament coneixements comuns implícits per a generar resposta', 'et': 'Mõtle, enne kui räägid: selgesõnaliselt kaudsete üldteadmiste loomine reageerimiseks', 'fi': 'Mieti ennen kuin puhut: Ekplisiittisesti implisiittisen yleisen järkevyyden tiedon luominen vastausten tuottamista varten', 'jv': 'deep', 'he': 'תחשוב לפני שאתה מדבר: ליצור באופן ברור ידע משמעותי משותף ליצירת תגובה', 'sk': 'Razmislite, preden govorite: Izrecno ustvarjanje implicitnega splošnega znanja za ustvarjanje odzivov', 'ha': 'Ka yi tunãni Kayyar da Kake faɗa: Explicitly Creating Emplicit Commonce for Result', 'bo': 'Think Before you speak: Explicitly Generating Implicit Commonsense Knowledge for Response Generation'}
{'en': 'Paraphrase identification involves identifying whether a pair of sentences express the same or similar meanings. While cross-encoders have achieved high performances across several benchmarks, bi-encoders such as SBERT have been widely applied to sentence pair tasks. They exhibit substantially lower computation complexity and are better suited to symmetric tasks. In this work, we adopt a bi-encoder approach to the paraphrase identification task, and investigate the impact of explicitly incorporating predicate-argument information into SBERT through weighted aggregation. Experiments on six paraphrase identification datasets demonstrate that, with a minimal increase in parameters, the proposed model is able to outperform SBERT/SRoBERTa significantly. Further, ablation studies reveal that the predicate-argument based component plays a significant role in the performance gain.', 'fr': "Les connaissances implicites, telles que le bon sens, sont essentielles à la fluidité des conversations humaines. Les modèles actuels de génération de réponse neuronale (RG) sont entraînés pour générer des réponses directement, en omettant les connaissances implicites non déclarées. Dans cet article, nous présentons Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), une approche générative visant à externaliser d'abord les connaissances implicites de bon sens ($think$) et à utiliser ces connaissances pour générer des réponses ($speak$). Nous soutenons que l'externalisation des connaissances implicites permet un apprentissage plus efficace, produit des réponses plus informatives et permet des modèles plus explicables. Nous analysons différents choix pour collecter des dialogues alignés sur les connaissances, représenter des connaissances implicites et faire la transition entre les connaissances et les dialogues. Les résultats empiriques montrent que les modèles du SCT surpassent les lignes de base de RG de bout en bout et augmentées par les connaissances sur la plupart des mesures automatiques et génèrent des réponses plus informatives, spécifiques et conformes au bon sens, telles qu'évaluées par les annotateurs humains. Le SCT génère également des connaissances qui ont du sens et qui sont pertinentes pour le dialogue environ 85\xa0% du temps", 'ar': 'المعرفة الضمنية ، مثل الفطرة السليمة ، هي مفتاح المحادثات البشرية السلسة. يتم تدريب نماذج توليد الاستجابة العصبية الحالية (RG) لتوليد استجابات مباشرة ، مع حذف المعرفة الضمنية غير المصرح بها. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم Think-Before-Speaking (TBS) ، وهو نهج توليدي لإخراج المعرفة المنطقية الضمنية أولاً (think $) واستخدام هذه المعرفة لتوليد الاستجابات ($ speak $). نحن نجادل بأن إضفاء المعرفة الضمنية على الخارج يسمح بتعلم أكثر كفاءة ، وينتج استجابات أكثر إفادة ، ويتيح نماذج أكثر قابلية للتفسير. نقوم بتحليل الخيارات المختلفة لجمع الحوارات المتوافقة مع المعرفة ، وتمثيل المعرفة الضمنية ، والانتقال بين المعرفة والحوارات. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نماذج TBS تتفوق في الأداء على خطوط أساس RG الشاملة والمزودة بالمعرفة في معظم المقاييس التلقائية وتنتج ردودًا أكثر إفادة ومحددة ومتابعة منطقية ، كما تم تقييمها من قبل المعلقين البشريين. تولد TBS أيضًا $ Knowledge $ الذي يكون منطقيًا وذو صلة بالحوار في حوالي 85٪ من الوقت', 'pt': 'O conhecimento implícito, como o senso comum, é a chave para conversas humanas fluidas. Os modelos atuais de geração de resposta neural (RG) são treinados para gerar respostas diretamente, omitindo o conhecimento implícito não declarado. Neste artigo, apresentamos Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), uma abordagem generativa para primeiro externalizar o conhecimento implícito do senso comum ($think$) e usar esse conhecimento para gerar respostas ($speak$). Argumentamos que a externalização do conhecimento implícito permite uma aprendizagem mais eficiente, produz respostas mais informativas e possibilita modelos mais explicáveis. Analisamos diferentes escolhas para coletar diálogos alinhados ao conhecimento, representar conhecimento implícito e transição entre conhecimento e diálogos. Os resultados empíricos mostram que os modelos TBS superam as linhas de base RG de ponta a ponta e de conhecimento aumentado na maioria das métricas automáticas e geram respostas mais informativas, específicas e de senso comum, conforme avaliado por anotadores humanos. O TBS também gera $conhecimento$ que faz sentido e é relevante para o diálogo em cerca de 85% das vezes', 'zh': '内隐之知,如常识者,流畅之要也。 今之神经应生(RG)训为直应,省未陈之隐式。 先思而后言(TBS),此生之道也,先以隐性知($think$)外化,因而应之($speak$)。 臣愚以为内隐知外化可以益学,更翔实之应,可以解形。 论异选,以收合对,隐含之知,与言语之间。 经验结果表明,TBS形于众指标之上,优于端到端,强于RG基线,生于人伦注释者评信益丰,更具常识性之应。 TBS有$knowledge美元,盖85%时皆有义,而关于对也。', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित ज्ञान, जैसे कि सामान्य ज्ञान, मानव वार्तालापों को तरल करने की कुंजी है। वर्तमान तंत्रिका प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी (आरजी) मॉडल को सीधे प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, जो अघोषित अंतर्निहित ज्ञान को छोड़ देता है। इस पेपर में, हम थिंक-बिफोर-स्पीकिंग (टीबीएस) पेश करते हैं, जो पहले अंतर्निहित कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान ($think $ ) को बाहर निकालने के लिए एक उत्पादक दृष्टिकोण है और प्रतिक्रियाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए इस ज्ञान का उपयोग करता है ($speak $ )। हम तर्क देते हैं कि अंतर्निहित ज्ञान को बाहरी बनाना अधिक कुशल सीखने की अनुमति देता है, अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण प्रतिक्रियाओं का उत्पादन करता है, और अधिक स्पष्ट मॉडल को सक्षम बनाता है। हम ज्ञान-संरेखित संवादों को इकट्ठा करने, अंतर्निहित ज्ञान का प्रतिनिधित्व करने और ज्ञान और संवादों के बीच संक्रमण के लिए विभिन्न विकल्पों का विश्लेषण करते हैं। अनुभवजन्य परिणामों से पता चलता है कि टीबीएस मॉडल अधिकांश स्वचालित मैट्रिक्स पर एंड-टू-एंड और ज्ञान-संवर्धित आरजी बेसलाइन को बेहतर बनाते हैं और मानव एनोटेटर द्वारा मूल्यांकन किए गए अनुसार अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण, विशिष्ट और कॉमनसेंस-निम्नलिखित प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करते हैं। TBS भी $knowledge $ उत्पन्न करता है जो समझ में आता है और लगभग 85% समय संवाद के लिए प्रासंगिक है', 'ru': 'Неявные знания, такие как здравый смысл, являются ключом к плавным человеческим разговорам. Текущие модели генерации нейронных ответов (RG) обучены генерировать ответы непосредственно, пропуская неявные знания. В этой статье мы представляем Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), генеративный подход к первой экстернализации неявных знаний здравого смысла ($ think$) и используем эти знания для генерирования ответов ($ speak$). Мы утверждаем, что экстернализация неявных знаний позволяет более эффективно учиться, дает более информативные ответы и обеспечивает более объяснимые модели. Мы анализируем различные варианты для сбора диалогов, ориентированных на знания, представляем неявные знания и переход между знаниями и диалогами. Эмпирические результаты показывают, что модели TBS превосходят сквозные и расширенные знаниями базовые линии RG по большинству автоматических метрик и генерируют более информативные, конкретные и отвечающие здравому смыслу ответы, согласно оценке человеческих аннотаторов. TBS также генерирует $ knowledge$ , что имеет смысл и актуально для диалога около 85% времени', 'es': 'El conocimiento implícito, como el sentido común, es clave para que las conversaciones humanas fluyan. Los modelos actuales de generación de respuestas neuronales (RG) están entrenados para generar respuestas directamente, omitiendo el conocimiento implícito no declarado. En este artículo, presentamos Pensar antes de hablar (TBS), un enfoque generativo para externalizar primero el conocimiento implícito de sentido común ($think$) y usar este conocimiento para generar respuestas ($speak$). Sostenemos que la externalización del conocimiento implícito permite un aprendizaje más eficiente, produce respuestas más informativas y permite modelos más explicables. Analizamos diferentes opciones para recopilar diálogos alineados con el conocimiento, representar el conocimiento implícito y hacer la transición entre el conocimiento y los diálogos. Los resultados empíricos muestran que los modelos de TBS superan los puntos de referencia de RG de principio a fin y aumentados en el conocimiento en la mayoría de las métricas automáticas y generan respuestas más informativas, específicas y de seguimiento de sentido común, según lo evaluado por anotadores humanos. TBS también genera $knowledge$ que tiene sentido y es relevante para el diálogo alrededor del 85% del tiempo', 'ja': '常識のような暗黙の知識は、流動的な人間の会話の鍵です。 現在のニューラルレスポンス生成（ Ｒ Ｇ ）モデルは、明示されていない暗黙の知識を省略して、応答を直接生成するように訓練される。 この論文では、暗黙の常識的知識（$ think $）を最初に外部化し、この知識を応答（$ speak $）を生成するために使用する生成的アプローチであるThink - Before - Speaking （ TBS ）を提示する。 私たちは、暗黙の知識を外部化することで、より効率的な学習が可能になり、より情報に富んだ回答を生み出し、より説明可能なモデルを可能にすると主張しています。 私たちは、さまざまな選択肢を分析して、知識に沿った対話を収集し、暗黙の知識を表し、知識と対話の間の移行を表します。 実証結果は、TBSモデルがほとんどの自動測定基準でエンドツーエンドおよび知識拡張RGベースラインを上回り、ヒューマンアノテーターによって評価されるように、より情報量が多く、具体的で、常識に従った応答を生成することを示しています。 TBSはまた、約85%の時間で理にかなった$知識$を生成し、対話に関連しています。', 'ga': 'Tá eolas intuigthe, cosúil le tuiscint choiteann, ríthábhachtach do chomhráite sreabhán daonna. Cuirtear oiliúint ar mhúnlaí giniúna freagartha néarúla (RG) atá ann faoi láthair chun freagraí a ghiniúint go díreach, rud a fhágann go bhfágtar eolas intuigthe neamhshonraithe. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid Think-Before-Speaking (TBS) i láthair, cur chuige ginideach chun eolas tuiscint coiteann intuigthe a sheachtrú ar dtús ($think$) agus úsáidimid an t-eolas seo chun freagraí a ghiniúint ($speak$). Áitímid go gceadaítear foghlaim níos éifeachtaí trí eolas intuigthe a sheachtrachú, go gcruthaítear freagraí níos eolasaí, agus go gcumasaítear samhlacha níos soiléire. Déanaimid anailís ar roghanna éagsúla chun idirphlé atá ailínithe le heolas a bhailiú, eolas intuigthe a léiriú, agus aistriú idir eolas agus idirphlé. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha go n-éiríonn níos fearr le samhlacha TBS ó cheann go ceann agus bonnlínte RG breisithe eolais ar fhormhór na méadrachta uathoibríocha agus gineann siad freagraí níos eolasaí, níos sainiúla agus le tuiscint choitianta, mar a mheasfaidh nótaíóirí daonna. Gineann TBS $eolas$ freisin a bhfuil ciall leis agus a bhaineann leis an idirphlé timpeall 85% den am', 'ka': 'იმპლექტიური მეცნიერება, როგორც საერთო სიგრძე, არის გასაკუთარი ადამიანის საუბარებისთვის. მიმდინარე ნეიროლური პარამეტრების შექმნა (RG) მოდელები უკეთესი პარამეტრების შექმნა, გადასრულება უკეთესი იმპლიციტური ცოდნა. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ დავიყენებთ Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), წარმოიდგინეთ პირველი გარეშე იმპლიციტური საზოგადოებო ცოდნა ($think$) და გამოიყენებთ ეს ცოდნა, რომელიც განახლება ($speak$). ჩვენ არგებთ, რომ გარეშე იმპლიციტიური ცნობილება უფრო ეფექტიური სწავლების შესაძლებელია, უფრო ინფორმაციური პასუხების შესაძლებელია და უფრო განახსნავი მოდე ჩვენ განსხვავებული მონიშვნების ანალიზაცია, რომ ცნობიერების შესაბამისი დიალოგიები შეიყვანოთ, გამოსაბამისი ცნობიერები და ცნობიერების და დიალოგის შორის გადატან იმპერიკალური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს TBS მოდელების გარეშე დასრულებული და ცნობიერების გარეშე RG ბაზი ხაზების უფრო ავტომატური მეტრიკაში და უფრო ინფორმატიური, სპექტიური და საშუალოდ დასრულებული პასუხები TBS კიდევ იქნება $ ცნობიერება, რომელიც ცნობიერებულია და იქნება 85% დროის დიალოგის შესახებ', 'hu': 'Az implicit tudás, mint például a józan ész, kulcsfontosságú a folyékony emberi beszélgetésekhez. Az aktuális neurális válasz generálása (RG) modelleket arra képezik, hogy közvetlenül válaszokat generáljanak, kihagyva a nem állapított implicit tudást. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Think-before-speaking (TBS), egy generációs megközelítést, amely először externalizálja az implicit közérzeti tudást ($think$), és ezt a tudást arra használja, hogy válaszokat generáljon ($speaki$). Azzal érvelünk, hogy az implicit tudás externalizálása hatékonyabb tanulást tesz lehetővé, informatívabb válaszokat eredményez, és megmagyarázhatóbb modelleket tesz lehetővé. Különböző lehetőségeket elemzünk a tudásalapú párbeszédek összegyűjtésére, az implicit tudás képviselésére, valamint a tudás és a párbeszédek közötti átmenetre. Az empirikus eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a TBS modellek a legtöbb automatikus mutató esetében felülmúlják a teljesítményt és a tudásbővített RG alapvető értékeket, és információsabb, konkrétabb és közértelmes válaszokat generálnak, amint azt az emberi kommentátorok értékelik. A TBS $knowledge dollárt is generál, ami érthető és az esetek 85%-ában releváns a párbeszédhez.', 'el': 'Η σιωπηρή γνώση, όπως η κοινή λογική, είναι το κλειδί για τις ρευστές ανθρώπινες συζητήσεις. Τα τρέχοντα μοντέλα παραγωγής νευρωνικής απόκρισης εκπαιδεύονται για να παράγουν απαντήσεις άμεσα, παραλείποντας ανεπιφύλακτη έμμεση γνώση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια παραγωγική προσέγγιση για την πρώτη εξωτερίκευση της σιωπηρής γνώσης κοινής λογικής ($σκέψου$) και τη χρήση αυτής της γνώσης για την παραγωγή απαντήσεων ($μίλα$). Υποστηρίζουμε ότι η ε&ωτερικότητα της έμμεσης γνώσης επιτρέπει πιο αποτελεσματική μάθηση, παράγει πιο ενημερωτικές απαντήσεις και επιτρέπει πιο επεξηγηματικά μοντέλα. Αναλύουμε διαφορετικές επιλογές για τη συλλογή διαλόγων ευθυγραμμισμένων με τη γνώση, την αναπαράσταση της σιωπηρής γνώσης και τη μετάβαση μεταξύ γνώσης και διαλόγων. Τα εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι τα μοντέλα ξεπερνούν τις γραμμές βάσης για τις περισσότερες αυτόματες μετρήσεις και παράγουν πιο ενημερωτικές, συγκεκριμένες και κοινές απαντήσεις, όπως αξιολογούνται από τους ανθρώπινους σχολιαστές. Το TBS παράγει επίσης $γνώση$ που έχει νόημα και είναι σχετικό με τον διάλογο γύρω από 85% του χρόνου', 'it': "La conoscenza implicita, come il buon senso, è la chiave per conversazioni umane fluide. I modelli attuali di generazione di risposta neurale (RG) sono addestrati per generare risposte direttamente, omettendo conoscenze implicite non dichiarate. In questo articolo, presentiamo Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), un approccio generativo per esternalizzare prima la conoscenza implicita di senso comune ($think$) e utilizzare questa conoscenza per generare risposte ($speak$). Sosteniamo che esternalizzare la conoscenza implicita consente un apprendimento più efficiente, produce risposte più informative e consente modelli più spiegabili. Analizziamo diverse scelte per raccogliere dialoghi allineati alla conoscenza, rappresentare la conoscenza implicita e la transizione tra conoscenza e dialogo. I risultati empirici mostrano che i modelli TBS superano le linee di base end-to-end e knowledge-augmented RG sulla maggior parte delle metriche automatiche e generano risposte più informative, specifiche e di buon senso, come valutate dagli annotatori umani. TBS genera anche $knowledge$ che ha senso ed è rilevante per il dialogo circa l'85% delle volte", 'kk': 'Жалпы сезім сияқты мәлімет - адамдық сөйлесудің кілті. Назардағы невралдық жауап беру үлгілері (RG) жауап беру үшін тәртіпсіздік мәліметті құру үшін оқылған. Бұл қағазда Think- Before- Speaking (TBS) дегенді бірінші сыртқы көпшілік мәліметті ($think$) құру үшін жауап беру үшін қолданып, ол мәліметті ($speak$) жауап беру үшін қолданамыз. Біз, сыртқы мәліметтердің көмегімен оқытуға мүмкіндік береді, мәліметтік жауап береді және түсінікті үлгілерді мүмкіндік береді. Біз білім тіркелген диалогтарды жинақтау үшін әртүрлі таңдауларды анализ, білім мен диалогтар арасындағы ауыстыру үшін мәліметтерді таңдаймыз. Эмпирикалық нәтижелер TBS үлгілерін автоматты түрде метрикалық метрикалық негізгі RG негізгі сызықтардан шығару және адамдардың оқиғаларының оқиға сәйкес мәліметті, ерекше және көптеген жауаптарды жасау үші ТBS мұндай-ақ $білім$ дегенді құрады және 85% уақыттың диалогына қатынасыз болады.', 'lt': 'Netiesioginės žinios, pvz., sveikas protas, yra labai svarbios skystiems žmogaus pokalbiams. Dabartiniai neurologinio atsako generavimo (RG) modeliai yra parengti tiesiogiai sukuriant atsakus, nepaisant nenustatytų netiesioginių žinių. Šiame dokumente pristatome „Mąstyti prieš kalbant“ (TBS), generuojantį požiūrį, kad pirmiausia būtų išplėsta netiesioginės bendros supratimos žinios ($think$) ir šios žinios būtų naudojamos atsakams gauti ($speak$). Mes teigiame, kad netiesioginių žinių išorės įtraukimas leidžia veiksmingiau mokytis, suteikia daugiau informacinių atsakymų ir suteikia galimybę paaiškinti modelius. Analizuojame įvairius pasirinkimus rinkti žiniomis pagrįstus dialogus, atstovauti netiesioginėms žinioms ir perėjimui tarp žinių ir dialogų. Empiriniai rezultatai rodo, kad TBS modeliai, vertinami žmogaus anotatorių, yra didesni už kiekvienos savaitės ir žiniomis pagrįstus RG bazinius rodiklius ir sukuria daugiau informacinių, specifinių ir bendro pobūdžio atsakų. TBS taip pat sukuria $žinias$, kurios yra prasmingos ir svarbios dialogui apie 85 proc. laiko', 'mk': 'Имплицитното знаење, како што е здравата смисла, е клучно за течните човечки разговори. Моделите на актуелната генерација на нервен одговор (RG) се обучени да генерираат одговори директно, отпуштајќи нестатирано имплицитно знаење. Во овој весник, го претставуваме Мислете-Пред-Зборувањето (ТБС), генеративен пристап за прво да се искористи имплицитно заедничко знаење ($think$) и да се користи ова знаење за генерирање одговори ($speak$). We argue that externalizing implicit knowledge allows more efficient learning, produces more informative responses, and enables more explainable models.  Ние анализираме различни избори за собирање на дијалози во согласност со знаењето, претставуваме имплицитно знаење и транзиција помеѓу знаење и дијалози. Империските резултати покажуваат дека моделите на ТБС ги надминуваат базите на RG од крај до крај и зголемени со знаење на повеќето автоматски метрики и генерираат поинформативни, специфични и заеднички одговори, како што ги оценуваат човечките анотатори. TBS, исто така, генерира знаење од долари што има смисла и е релевантно за дијалогот околу 85 отсто од времето', 'ms': 'Pengetahuan implik, seperti akal biasa, adalah kunci untuk perbualan manusia cair. Model generasi balas saraf (RG) semasa dilatih untuk menghasilkan balas secara langsung, melepaskan pengetahuan implicit tidak ditetapkan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), pendekatan generatif untuk pertama-tama luarkan pengetahuan implicit umum ($think$) dan menggunakan pengetahuan ini untuk menghasilkan jawapan ($speak$). Kami menyangka bahawa pengluaran pengetahuan implicit membolehkan pembelajaran lebih efisien, menghasilkan balasan lebih maklumat, dan membolehkan model yang boleh dijelaskan. Kami menganalisis pilihan yang berbeza untuk mengumpulkan dialog sepanjang pengetahuan, mewakili pengetahuan implicit, dan transisi antara pengetahuan dan dialog. Keputusan empirik menunjukkan model TBS melampaui garis dasar RG akhir-akhir dan pengetahuan-ditambah pada kebanyakan metrik automatik dan menghasilkan balasan yang lebih maklumat, spesifik, dan biasa-mengikuti, seperti yang diuji oleh pengantar manusia. TBS juga menghasilkan $knowledge$ yang masuk akal dan berkaitan dengan dialog sekitar 85% masa', 'ml': 'പൊതുവായ മനസ്സിനെപ്പോലെ അസാധാരണ അറിവ് മനുഷ്യരുടെ സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള താക്കോലാണ്. നിലവിലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d പ്രതികരണ തലമുറയുടെ (RG) മോഡലുകള്\u200d നേരിട്ട് ഉത്തരമുണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു, ന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ചിന്തിക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, ആദ്യം പുറത്തുള്ള അകത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു ജനറലികമായ വഴിയ പുറത്തേക്ക് പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്ന വിജ്ഞാനം കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശിക്ഷ അനുവദിക്കുന്നു, കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുള്ള ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദ വ്യത്യസ്ത ത തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കണമെന്നും അറിവുകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാനും അറിവില്ലാത്ത സംസാരത്തെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കാനും അറിവുകള്\u200dക് എമിരിക്കല്\u200d ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ടിബിഎസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d അവസാനം മുതല്\u200d അവസാനം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും അറിവ് മേട്രിക്കളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും കൂടുതല്\u200d  ടിബിഎസിന്റെ വിജ്ഞാനം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന $85% സമയത്തിന്റെ സംസാരത്തിന് സാധ്യതയുണ്ട്.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний яриаг шингэний түлхүүр гэсэн мэдлэг юм. Одоогийн мэдрэлийн хариу үйлдвэрлэл (RG) загваруудыг шууд хариу үйлдвэрлэхэд сургалтын төлөөлөгдсөн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Think-Before-Speaking (TBS) гэдэг нь анхны гадаад нээлттэй мэдлэг ($think$) болон хариу үйлдвэрлэхийн тулд энэ мэдлэг ашиглаж байна. Бид гадаад талаарх мэдлэг нь илүү үр дүнтэй суралцах боломжтой, илүү мэдээллийн хариу үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой, илүү тайлбарлах загваруудыг боловсруулдаг гэж хэлж байна. Бид өөр өөр сонголтуудыг шинжилгээ хийж, мэдлэг, диалогуудын хоорондын шилжилт болон мэдлэг, мэдлэг, диалогуудын хоорондын шилжилт үзүүлдэг. Эрүүгийн үр дүнд TBS загваруудын төгсгөлд, мэдлэг дээр нэмэгдсэн RG суурь шугам нь ихэнх автоматически метрик дээр илүү мэдээллийн, тодорхой, нийтлэг санааны дараагийн хариултыг гаргадаг. TBS нь мөн $мэдлэг$ болон хугацааны 85%-ын диалогт хамааралтай байдаг.', 'no': 'Implicit kunnskap, som vanleg følelse, er nøkkel for fluid human conversations. Gjeldande nøyralsvarmodeller (RG) er trengte for å laga svar direkte, og fjernar ikkje stadig implisitt kunnskap. I denne papiret presenterer vi Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), ein generelt tilnærming til første eksterne implisitt fellessk kunnskap ($think$) og bruker denne kunnskapen for å laga svar ($speak$). Vi argumenterer at eksterne implisitt kunnskap tillater meir effektivt læring, produserer meir informativ svar og tillater meir forklarbare modeller. Vi analyserer forskjellige val for å samla vindauge med kunnskap, representerer implisitt kunnskap og overgang mellom kunnskap og dialogar. Empirical results show TBS models outperform end-to-end and knowledge-auged RG baselines on most automatic metrics and generate more informative, specific and commonsense-following responses, as evaluated by human annotators. TBS lagar også $kunnskap $ som har mening og er relevant for dialogen rundt 85% av tiden', 'pl': 'Wiedza domyślna, taka jak zdrowy rozsądek, jest kluczem do płynnych rozmów ludzkich. Aktualne modele generowania odpowiedzi neuronowej (RG) są przeszkolone do generowania odpowiedzi bezpośrednio, pomijając nieokreśloną wiedzę domniemaną. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), generatywne podejście do najpierw zewnętrznej eksternalizacji domniemanej wiedzy zdrowego rozsądku ($think$) i wykorzystania tej wiedzy do generowania odpowiedzi ($speak$). Twierdzimy, że zewnętrzność wiedzy domniemanej pozwala na bardziej efektywne uczenie się, wytwarza bardziej informacyjne reakcje i umożliwia bardziej wyjaśnione modele. Analizujemy różne wybory w celu zbierania dialogów dostosowanych do wiedzy, reprezentowania wiedzy domyślnej oraz przejścia między wiedzą a dialogami. Wyniki empiryczne pokazują, że modele TBS przewyższają kompleksowe i rozszerzone wiedzą bazy RG na większości automatycznych wskaźników i generują bardziej informacyjne, specyficzne i zdrowy rozsądek odpowiedzi, oceniane przez ludzkich adnotatorów. TBS generuje również $knowledge$ co ma sens i jest istotne dla dialogu około 85% czasu', 'ro': 'Cunoașterea implicită, cum ar fi bunul simț, este cheia conversațiilor umane fluide. Modelele curente de generare a răspunsului neural (RG) sunt instruite pentru a genera răspunsuri directe, omițând cunoștințele implicite nesatisfăcute. În această lucrare, prezentăm Think-before-Speaking (TBS), o abordare generativă pentru externalizarea mai întâi a cunoștințelor implicite de bun sens ($think$) și utilizarea acestor cunoștințe pentru a genera răspunsuri ($vorbesc$). Susținem că externalizarea cunoștințelor implicite permite o învățare mai eficientă, produce răspunsuri mai informative și permite modele mai explicabile. Analizăm diferite opțiuni pentru a colecta dialoguri aliniate cunoașterii, pentru a reprezenta cunoașterea implicită și tranziția între cunoaștere și dialog. Rezultatele empirice arată că modelele TBS depășesc valorile de bază end-to-end și bazate pe cunoștințe îmbunătățite RG în majoritatea măsurătorilor automate și generează răspunsuri mai informative, specifice și de bun sens, evaluate de adnotatorii umani. TBS generează, de asemenea,  $knowledge$ care are sens și este relevant pentru dialog în jur de 85% din timp', 'sr': 'Implicitno znanje, poput zajedničkog smisla, je ključ za tečne ljudske razgovore. Trenutni modeli generacije neuralnih reakcija (RG) obučeni su da bi izravno stvorili reakcije, izbjegavajući nepotkriveno implicitno znanje. U ovom papiru predstavljamo razmišljanje pre govora (TBS), generativni pristup prvom izvanrednom implicitnom znanju zajedničkog znanja ($think$) i koristimo to znanje kako bi stvorili odgovore ($speak$). Tvrdimo da vanjska implicitna znanja omogućava učenje efikasnijim, proizvodi informativniji odgovor i omogućava objašnjivije modele. Analiziramo različite izbore za prikupljanje dijaloga usklađenih na znanje, predstavljamo implicitno znanje i prelaz između znanja i dijaloga. Impirički rezultati pokazuju da modeli TBS-a nadmađuju osnovne linije RG na većini automatskih metrika i stvaraju informativnije, specifičnije i slijedeće odgovore na najvišem kraju do kraja i znanja, kao što su procjenjivali ljudski annotatori. TBS takođe stvara znanje $ koje ima smisla i vezano za dijalog oko 85% vremena', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය අදහසක් වගේ දැනගන්න පුළුවන් මිනිස්සු කතා කරන්න පුළුවන්. ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර (RG) මොඩේල් සිද්ධිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරලා තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරත මේ පැත්තේ අපි හිතන්න කලින් කතා කරනවා (TBS), මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා එළියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විශ්වාසිත දැනගන්න, තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, තව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි වෙනස් විකල්පයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා දන්නවත් සම්බන්ධ සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ කරගන්න, දැනගන්න සහ සංවාදය අතර ප එම්පිරිකාලික ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර TBS මොඩල් අවස්ථානය අවස්ථානයෙන් අවස්ථානයෙන් අවස්ථානයෙන් අවස්ථානය කරන්න පුළුවන් අවස්ථානයෙ @ info', 'so': "aqoonta caadiga ah, sida maanka caadiga ah, waa kaliga hadalka dadka oo aad u baahan tahay. Tusaalada jawaabta neurada ah (RG) waxaa lagu baraa si loo toos u sameeyo jawaabaha tooska ah, wuxuuna ka tagayaa aqoonta la'aanta. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa Fikir-ka-hor-ka hadlidda (TBS), waa qaab general ah oo ugu horeeya aqoonta dibadda ah ee aqoonta qarsoodiga ah ($fikir) waxaana isticmaalaynaa aqoontan si aan u sameyno jawaabo ($ku hadlo). Waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa in aqoonta dibadda loo soo saaro uu xaq u yeelan karo waxbarasho faa’iido badan, wuxuuna soo bixinayaa jawaabo macluumaad badan, wuxuuna qaban karaa tusaalooyin kale oo faa’iido ah. Waxaynu baaraynaa doorashooyin kala duduwan si aan u soo ururiyo dialogueoyin aqoonta la isku hagayo, waxaynu ka tirsanaynaa aqoonta sahlan, iyo bedelka aqoonta iyo dialogueyda. Shaqoyinka la yidhaahdo waxay muujiyaan tusaalaha TBS oo ku qoran dhammaadka ugu dambaysta iyo aqoonta lagu kordhiyey qoraalka RG oo ku qoran meelaha ugu dhow ee maamaamulka ah, waxayna dhashaan macluumaad dheeraad ah oo gaar ah iyo jawaabo soo raacaya, sida loo qiimeynayo dadka wax ku saabsan. TBS wuxuu sidoo kale dhashaa $aqoonta oo waxyaabaha leh oo la xiriira dialogue qiyaas 85 boqolkiiba waqtiga", 'sv': 'Implicit kunskap, såsom sunt förnuft, är nyckeln till flytande mänskliga samtal. Nuvarande modeller för generering av neurala svar (RG) utbildas för att generera svar direkt, utelämnande av ospataterad implicit kunskap. I denna uppsats presenterar vi Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), ett generativt tillvägagångssätt för att först externalisera implicit allmännyttig kunskap ($think$) och använda denna kunskap för att generera svar ($talk$). Vi hävdar att externalisering av implicit kunskap möjliggör effektivare lärande, ger mer informativa svar och möjliggör mer förklaringsbara modeller. Vi analyserar olika val för att samla kunskapsanpassade dialoger, representera implicit kunskap och övergång mellan kunskap och dialoger. Empiriska resultat visar att TBS-modeller överträffar end-to-end och kunskapsförstärkta RG-baslinjer på de flesta automatiska mätvärden och genererar mer informativa, specifika och allmänsliga svar, som utvärderas av mänskliga kommentatorer. TBS genererar också $knowledge$ som är vettigt och relevant för dialogen runt 85% av tiden', 'ta': 'பொதுவான உணர்வு போன்ற பொதுவான அறிவு குழப்பமான மனித உரையாடல்களின் விசையாகும். Current neural response generation (RG) models are trained to generate responses directly, omitting unstated implicit knowledge.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சிந்திக்க- முன் பேசுவதற்கு (TBS), முதலில் வெளியேறும் வெளியேற்றும் அறிவு ($நினைக்கிறார்) மற்றும் இந்த அறிவை பயன்படுத்த வெளியேறுதல் அறிவு மிகவும் செல்லும் கற்றலை அனுமதிக்கும், இன்னும் தகவல் பதில்களை உருவாக்குகிறது, மேலும் விளக்கமான மாதிரிகளை ச அறிவு சேர்க்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல்களை ஒன்று சேர்க்க வேறு விருப்பங்களை நாம் ஆராய்வு செய்கிறோம், அறிவு மற்றும் உரையாடல்களுக வெற்றிகரமான முடிவு டிபிஎஸ் $85% நேரத்தில் பொருத்தமான உரையாடலுக்கும் பொருத்தமானது $அறிவு உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'معلوم علم، جیسے معلوم عقل، انسان کی باتوں کی کلیدی ہے. موجود نیورال جواب کی نسل (RG) موڈل سیدھے جواب کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے آموزش کی جاتی ہیں، غیر معلوم علم کو چھوڑ دیا جاتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم Think-Before-Speaking (TBS) کو پیش کرتے ہیں، پہلی بغیری بغیری بغیری معمولی علم (ڈالر سوچ ڈالر) کے لئے ایک جواب دینے والی تقریبا ہے اور اس علم کو استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم argue that externalizing implicit knowledge allows more efficient learning, produces more informative responses, and enables more explainable models. ہم مختلف انتخاباتوں کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ علم کے ساتھ مطابق صحبت کریں، معلوم علم کی تعبیر کریں اور علم اور صحبت کے درمیان تغییر کریں. امپراتیک نتائج ٹی بیس کی مدلکوں کو اخری-تا-آخر اور علم-اضافہ کی RG بنیس لینوں کو دکھاتے ہیں جو اکثر آٹوٹی میٹریک پر اضافہ کرتی ہیں اور زیادہ اطلاعات، خاص، اور عام-سمجھ کے نیچے جواب دیتے ہیں، جیسا کہ انسان کے اضافہ کرنے والے کے ذ ٹی بیس ڈالر کا علم بھی پیدا کرتا ہے جو سمجھ رکھتا ہے اور اس وقت کے 85% کے تقریباً مسئلہ ہے', 'mt': 'L-għarfien impliċitu, bħas-sens komuni, huwa kruċjali għall-konverżjonijiet fluwidi tal-bniedem. Il-mudelli attwali tal-ġenerazzjoni tar-rispons newrali (RG) huma mħarrġa biex jiġġeneraw risponsi direttament, billi jitħallew barra l-għarfien impliċitu mhux stmat. F’dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw “Think-Before-Speaking” (TBS), approċċ ġenerattiv biex l-ewwel jiġi esternalizzat l-għarfien impliċitu komuni ($think$) u nużaw dan l-għarfien biex jiġġeneraw reazzjonijiet ($speak$). Aħna jargumentaw li l-esternalizzazzjoni tal-għarfien impliċitu tippermetti tagħlim aktar effiċjenti, tipproduċi reazzjonijiet aktar informativi, u tippermetti mudelli aktar spjegabbli. Aħna nianalizzaw għażliet differenti biex niġbru djalogi allinjati mal-għarfien, nirrappreżentaw għarfien impliċitu, u tranżizzjoni bejn l-għarfien u d-djalogi. Ir-riżultati empiriċi juru li l-mudelli tat-TBS jaqbżu l-linji bażi tal-RG minn tarf sa tarf u miżjuda bl-għarfien fuq il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metriċi awtomatiċi u jiġġeneraw risponsi aktar informativi, speċifiċi u komuni li jsegwu, kif evalwati mill-annotaturi umani. It-TBS jiġġenera wkoll $għarfien$ li jagħmel sens u huwa rilevanti għad-djalogu madwar 85% tal-ħin', 'uz': "Umumiy ma'lumot, juda ko'p narsa, inson talabatlarining kaliti. Name Bu qogʻozda biz gapirishdan oldin o'ylaymiz, birinchi tashkilotni tashqarish imkoniyatlarni ($o'ylash) bilan birinchi generativ usul bilan ishlatamiz va bu maʼlumotni javoblar yaratish uchun foydalanamiz ($talab qilish). Biz murakkab qilamiz, ma'lumotni tashkilotga o'rganishga qo'shimcha foydalanishga ruxsat beradi, qo'shimcha maʼlumot javoblarini yaratadi, va ko'proq foydalanuvchi modellarni qo'llaydi. Биз маълумотларни тўплаш учун ўзгартириш имкониятларини таҳлил қиламиз, маълум маълумотларни таркиб қилиш ва илм ва dialogлар орасидаги ўзгартиш тарқатувчини таҳлил қиламиз. Empirical natijalari, oddiy taʼminlovchilar qiymatidan foydalanadigan RG asosida ishga tushirilgan tiBS modellarini ko'rsatadi. TBS also generates $knowledge$ that makes sense and is relevant to the dialogue around 85% of the time", 'vi': 'Kiến thức ngầm, như là lẽ thường, là chìa khóa để dịch chuyển cuộc đối thoại con người. Các mô hình phản ứng thần kinh hiện thời (RGB) được huấn luyện để tạo phản ứng trực tiếp, bỏ qua kiến thức ngầm không xác định. Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi giới thiệu Nghĩ-Trước-Nói (TBS), một cách phát triển để lần đầu tiên loại bỏ kiến thức ngầm chung(nghĩ),"và sử dụng kiến thức này để tạo ra phản ứng. Chúng tôi cho rằng việc trao đổi kiến thức ngầm cho phép học hành hiệu quả hơn, tạo ra các phản ứng thông tin hơn, và cho phép mô hình đáng giải thích. Chúng tôi phân tích các lựa chọn khác nhau để thu thập các ca thoại hợp kiến thức, đại diện cho kiến thức ngầm, và chuyển đổi giữa kiến thức và thoại. Kết quả Empirical shows TBS models outthực End-to-End và knowledge-tăng các nền tuyến RG trên hầu hết các thiết bị đo tự động và produc more informative, cụ thể, and common-sensitin-following answer, as described by human annators. TBS cũng phát ra', 'bg': 'Имлицитното знание, като здравия разум, е ключово за флуидните човешки разговори. Текущите модели за генериране на невронни реакции (РГ) са обучени да генерират отговори директно, пропускайки неизказано имплицитно знание. В тази статия представяме генеративен подход за външно екстериализиране на имплицитното общо разумно знание ($мисли$) и използване на това знание за генериране на отговори ($говори$). Ние твърдим, че екстериализирането на имплицитното знание позволява по-ефективно учене, произвежда по-информативни отговори и позволява по-обясними модели. Анализираме различни избори за събиране на съгласувани със знанието диалози, представяне на имплицитно знание и преход между знание и диалози. Емпиричните резултати показват, че моделите надминават базовите линии от край до край и разширени със знания при повечето автоматични показатели и генерират по-информативни, специфични и последователни отговори, оценени от човешки анотатори. Също така генерира $знание$, което има смисъл и е от значение за диалога около 85% от времето', 'nl': 'Implicite kennis, zoals gezond verstand, is de sleutel tot vloeiende menselijke gesprekken. De huidige modellen voor neuronale responsgeneratie (RG) worden getraind om direct reacties te genereren, waarbij onbeduidende impliciete kennis overblijft. In dit artikel presenteren we Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), een generatieve benadering om eerst impliciete kennis van commonsense ($think$) te externaliseren en deze kennis te gebruiken om reacties te genereren ($speak$). We stellen vast dat het externaliseren van impliciete kennis efficiënter leert, meer informatieve reacties oplevert en meer uitlegbare modellen mogelijk maakt. We analyseren verschillende keuzes om kennisgerichte dialogen te verzamelen, impliciete kennis te vertegenwoordigen en de overgang tussen kennis en dialogen te bevorderen. Empirische resultaten tonen aan dat TBS-modellen beter presteren dan end-to-end en knowledge-augmented RG-baselines op de meeste automatische metrics en meer informatieve, specifieke en gezonde reacties genereren, zoals geëvalueerd door menselijke annotatoren. TBS genereert ook $knowledge$ die zinvol is en relevant is voor de dialoog rond 85% van de tijd', 'hr': 'Implicitno znanje, poput zajedničkog smisla, ključ je za tečne ljudske razgovore. Trenutni modeli generacije neuroloških odgovora (RG) obučeni su kako bi izravno stvorili odgovore, uključujući nepotkriveno implicitno znanje. U ovom papiru predstavljamo razmišljanje prije govora (TBS), generativni pristup prvom izvanrednom implicitnom znanjem češće znanja ($think$) i koristimo te znanje kako bi stvorili odgovore ($speak$). Tvrdimo da vanjska implicitna znanja omogućava učinkovitije učenja, proizvodi informativnije odgovore i omogućava objašnjivije modele. Analiziramo različite izbore za prikupljanje dijaloga usklađenih na znanje, predstavljamo implicitne znanje i prelaz između znanja i dijaloga. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da modeli TBS-a nadmađuju početne linije RG na većini automatskih metrika i proizvode informativnije, specifičnije i slijedeće odgovore češće smisla, kako su procjenjivali ljudski annotatori. TBS također stvara znanje $ koje ima smisla i relevantno za dijalog oko 85% vremena', 'da': 'Implicit viden, såsom sund fornuft, er nøglen til flydende menneskelige samtaler. Nuværende neurale responsgenereringsmodeller (RG) trænes til at generere responser direkte og udelader usikret implicit viden. I denne artikel præsenterer vi Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), en generativ tilgang til først at eksternalisere implicit almindelig viden ($think$) og bruge denne viden til at generere svar ($tale$). Vi hævder, at eksternalisering af implicit viden giver mulighed for mere effektiv læring, giver mere informative svar og muliggør mere forklarelige modeller. Vi analyserer forskellige valg for at indsamle viden-tilpassede dialoger, repræsentere implicit viden og overgangen mellem viden og dialoger. Empiriske resultater viser, at TBS-modeller overgår end-to-end og vidensforøgede RG-basislinjer på de fleste automatiske målinger og genererer mere informative, specifikke og almindelige svar, som vurderes af menneskelige kommentatorer. TBS genererer også $knowledge$ som giver mening og er relevant for dialogen omkring 85% af tiden', 'de': 'Implizites Wissen, wie der gesunde Menschenverstand, ist der Schlüssel zu fließenden menschlichen Gesprächen. Aktuelle Modelle zur Generierung neuronaler Reaktionen (RG) werden trainiert, um Antworten direkt zu generieren, wobei unausgesprochenes implizites Wissen weggelassen wird. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Think-Before-Speaking (TBS) vor, einen generativen Ansatz, um implizites Commonsense Wissen zunächst zu externalisieren ($think$) und dieses Wissen zu nutzen, um Antworten zu generieren ($speak$). Wir argumentieren, dass die Externalisierung impliziten Wissens effizienteres Lernen ermöglicht, informativere Antworten erzeugt und erklärbarere Modelle ermöglicht. Wir analysieren verschiedene Auswahlmöglichkeiten, um wissensorientierte Dialoge zu sammeln, implizites Wissen darzustellen und den Übergang zwischen Wissen und Dialogen zu ermöglichen. Empirische Ergebnisse zeigen, dass TBS-Modelle durchgängige und wissenserweiterte RG-Baselines auf den meisten automatischen Metriken übertreffen und informativere, spezifische und gesunde Antworten generieren, die von menschlichen Kommentatoren bewertet werden. TBS generiert auch $knowledge$ das Sinn macht und für den Dialog rund 85% der Zeit relevant ist', 'id': 'Pengetahuan implicit, seperti rasa sehat, adalah kunci untuk percakapan manusia cair. Model generasi respon saraf (RG) saat ini dilatih untuk menghasilkan respon secara langsung, melewatkan pengetahuan implicit yang tidak diketahui. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), pendekatan generatif untuk pertama-tama externalisasi pengetahuan implicit umum ($think$) dan menggunakan pengetahuan ini untuk menghasilkan respon ($speak$). Kami berdebat bahwa externalisasi pengetahuan implicit memungkinkan belajar lebih efisien, memproduksi respon lebih informatif, dan memungkinkan model yang bisa dijelaskan. Kami menganalisis pilihan yang berbeda untuk mengumpulkan dialog yang disesuaikan dengan pengetahuan, mewakili pengetahuan implicit, dan transisi antara pengetahuan dan dialog. Hasil imperial menunjukkan model TBS melebihi garis dasar RG akhir-akhir dan pengetahuan-meningkat pada kebanyakan metrik otomatis dan menghasilkan respon yang lebih informatif, spesifik, dan commonsense-following, seperti yang diteliti oleh anotator manusia. TBS also generates $knowledge$ that makes sense and is relevant to the dialogue around 85% of the time', 'fa': 'دانش معمولی مثل حس معمولی، کلیدی برای گفتگوهای انسان مایع است. مدل\u200cهای جواب عصبی (RG) فعلی برای تولید پاسخ مستقیم آموزش داده می\u200cشوند، از دست دادن دانش غیر معلوم. در این کاغذ، ما به فکر-Before-Speaking (TBS) یک روش تولید می\u200cکنیم، برای اولین دانش معمولی بیرون\u200cالمللی (فکر$) و از این دانش استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا پاسخ\u200cهای تولید کنیم ($speak$). ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که دانش\u200cهای خارجی مثبت به یادگیری\u200cهای مثبت\u200cتر اجازه می\u200cدهد، جواب\u200cهای اطلاعات بیشتری را تولید می\u200cکند، و مدل\u200cهای قابل توضیح بیشتری را اجازه می\u200cدهد. ما انتخاب\u200cهای مختلف را برای جمع کردن диалог\u200cهای مشترک علم تحلیل می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم دانش\u200cهای مشترک و تغییر بین دانش و диалог\u200cها. نتیجه امپراتیک مدل TBS را نشان می دهد که پایگاه\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای RG را بر بیشترین متریک\u200cهای خودکار بالا می\u200cبرد و پاسخ\u200cهای اطلاعات، خاص\u200cتر و طبیعی\u200cتر را تولید می\u200cکند، همانطور که توسط آشنایی\u200cکنندگان انسان ارزیابی می\u200cکند. TBS همچنین دانش $ را تولید می\u200cکند که منطقی است و با گفتگوی حدود ۸۵ درصد زمان ارتباط دارد', 'ko': '숨은 지식, 예를 들어 상식은 유창한 인류 대화의 관건이다.현재의 신경반응 생성(RG) 모델은 직접 생성 반응으로 훈련돼 진술되지 않은 숨은 지식을 무시했다.본고에서 우리는 먼저 은연중에 담겨진 상식지식(Think$)을 외화시키고 이러한 지식을 이용하여 응답(speak$)을 생성하는 생성적인 방법을 제시했다.우리는 내은 지식의 외화는 학습 효율을 향상시키고 더 많은 정보 피드백을 생성하며 더 많은 해석 가능한 모델을 구축할 수 있다고 생각한다.우리는 서로 다른 선택을 분석하여 지식과 일치하는 대화를 수집하고 은밀한 지식, 그리고 지식과 대화 간의 전환을 나타냈다.실증 결과에 따르면 TBS 모델은 대부분의 자동 지표에서 끝에서 끝까지 지식이 강화된 RG 기선보다 우수하고 인류 주석자가 평가한 것처럼 더 많은 정보, 구체적, 상식적인 후속 응답을 생성한다.TBS에 $knowledge$가 생겼습니다. 이것은 의미가 있고 약 85%의 시간이 대화와 관련이 있습니다.', 'sw': 'Maelezo yasiyo na msingi, kama vile maana ya kawaida, ni ufunguo wa mazungumzo ya watu yanayotokana na maji. Mradi wa majibu ya sasa (RG) unafundishwa kutengeneza miitikio moja kwa moja, ukiacha maarifa yasiyoeleweka. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha kufikiri-Kabla ya kuzungumza (TBS), njia ya jeneral ya kwanza ya maarifa yanayotumika nje ya mawasiliano ($kufikiri) na kutumia ujuzi huu ili kutengeneza majibu ($ongezeko). Tunahoji kuwa maarifa ya nje yanaruhusu kujifunza kwa ufanisi zaidi, hutengeneza majibu zaidi ya taarifa, na inawezesha mifano yenye ufafanuzi zaidi. Tunafahamu chaguo tofauti ili kukusanya mazungumzo yanayofanana na maarifa, wakiwakilisha maarifa yasiyoeleweka, na mabadiliko kati ya maarifa na mazungumzo. Matokeo ya kipekee yanaonyesha mifano ya TBS yanayoendesha mwishoni mwa mwishoni na maendeleo ya maarifa yanayoongezeka kwenye mbinu za kujitegemea na kutengeneza taarifa zaidi, hususani na mawasiliano yanayofuata, kama ilivyovutiwa na matangazo ya binadamu. TBS pia inatengeneza dola za kimarekani za maarifa ambazo zina maana na inahusiana na mazungumzo ya takriban asilimia 85 ya wakati', 'tr': 'Adamlar gürrüňlerini ýok duýgular ýaly çykyş bilim. Häzirki näyral jogabat generalizasy (RG) nusgalary direkt jogaby bejermek üçin bilinýär. Bu kagyzda düşünmek-öňünden gürleşmek (TBS) täsir edýäris, ilkinji daşaryk diňe meňzeş bilim bilen täsirli bir nusga ($think$) we bu bilimi çykarmak üçin ullanýarys ($speak$). Döwürmekde gizlin bilgi daşary ukyplaryň täsirli öwrenmesine mümkin edýändigini aýdýarys we daşary informative jogaplary täsir edýär we daşary düşünjeli nusgalary mümkin edip bilýäris. Bilim çözümlerini toplamak üçin farklı seçmeleri çözümleşdirip, bilim we dialoglaryň arasynda geçişik temsil edýäris. Impirik netijeler TBS modelleri end-to-end we knowledge-augmented RG baselines on the most automatic metrics and generate more informative, specific, and commonsense-following responses, as evaluated by human annotators. TBS hem $bilim$ sany bar we wagtyň 85% daşyndaky dialoga baglanşygy bar', 'af': "Inplisite kennis, soos gemeenskap sens, is sleutel na fluid menslike gesprekke. Huidige neurale antwoord genereering (RG) modele word opgelei om reaksies direk te genereer, verwerp onderstateerde impliseerde kennis. In hierdie papier, ons voorsien Think- Before- Speaking (TBS),  'n genereerbare toegang na eerste eksterne inplisite gemeenskaplike kennis ($think$) en gebruik hierdie kennis om reaksies ($speak$) te genereer. Ons argumenteer dat eksternalisering inplisite kennis toelaat meer effektief leer, produseer meer inligbare reaksies en laat meer verduidelike modele toe. Ons analiseer verskillende keuses om kennis-gelykte dialoog te samel, te stel inplisite kennis en oorgang tussen kennis en dialoog. Enigeriese resultate vertoon TBS modele uitvoer end-to-end en kennis-vergroot RG basisline op mees outomatiese metries en genereer meer inligting, spesifieke en gemeenskaplike-volgende antwoordes, soos geevalueer deur menslike annotators. TBS genereer ook $kennis$ wat maak sin en is relevant na die dialoog omtrent 85% van die tyd", 'sq': 'Njohja implike, e tillë si kuptimi i përbashkët, është çelësi për bisedimet e fluiduara njerëzore. Modelet aktuale të gjenerimit të përgjigjes nervore (RG) janë trajnuar për të gjeneruar përgjigje drejtpërdrejt, duke hequr dorë nga njohuritë implicite të papërcaktuara. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një qasje gjenerative për të externalizuar së pari njohuritë implicite të përbashkëta ($think$) dhe të përdorim këtë njohuri për të gjeneruar përgjigje ($talk$). Argumentojmë se eksternalizimi i njohurive implicite lejon mësim më të efektshëm, prodhon përgjigje më informative dhe mundëson modele më të shpjeguara. Ne analizojmë zgjedhje të ndryshme për të mbledhur dialoge të përputhura me njohuritë, përfaqësojmë njohuritë implicite dhe tranzicionin midis njohuritë dhe dialogeve. Empirical results show TBS models outperform end-to-end and knowledge-augmented RG baselines on most automatic metrics and generate more informative, specific, and commonsense-following responses, as evaluated by human annotators.  TBS gjeneron gjithashtu njohuri $ që ka kuptim dhe është e rëndësishme për dialogun rreth 85% të kohës', 'hy': "Implicit knowledge, such as common sense, is key to fluid human conversations.  Այսօրվա նյարդային արձագանքի (RG) մոդելները սովորեցված են անմիջապես արձագանքներ ստեղծելու համար, բաց թողնելով անստացված ենթադրական գիտելիքը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մտածել-մինչ-խոսել (ՏԲՍ), ստեղծագործական մոտեցում առաջին անկախ ընդհանուր գիտելիքների արտադրման համար ($մտածեք$) և օգտագործում ենք այս գիտելիքները արձագանքներ ստեղծելու համար ($խոսել$). Մենք փաստարկում ենք, որ ենթադրական գիտելիքների արտադրումը հնարավորություն է տալիս ավելի արդյունավետ ուսումնասիրություն, ստեղծում է ավելի ինֆորմատիվ պատասխաններ և հնարավորություն է տալիս ավելի բացատրելի մոդելներ: Մենք վերլուծում ենք տարբեր տարբերակներ' հավաքելու գիտելիքներով համապատասխանված հաղորդագրություններ, ներկայացնելու ենթարկված գիտելիքները և տեղեկատվության և հաղորդագրությունների միջև անցումը: Իմպիրական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ԹԲՍ մոդելները գերազանցում են վերջ-վերջ և գիտելիքով բարձրացված ՌԳ հիմնական գծերը ավտոմատիկ մետրիկայի վրա և ստեղծում են ավելի ինֆորմատիվ, կոնկրետ և հաճախ հետևող արձագանքներ, ինչպես գնահատում են մարդկային նոտոտորա ԹԲՍ-ը նաև ստեղծում է $գիտելիք$, որը իմաստալից է և կարևոր է ժամանակի 85 տոկոսի ընթացքում", 'am': 'እውቀት፣ አካባቢ አስተዋይ፣ የውሃ የሰው ንግግር መክፈቻ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ የጥያቄ መልስ ትውልድ In this paper, we present Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), a generative approach to first externalize implicit commonsense knowledge ($think$) and use this knowledge to generate responses ($speak$).  ውጪው እውቀት ለማስተማር የሚችል፣ የብዙ አስተማሪ መልስ የሚያደርግ እና የሚጠያየቅ ምሳሌዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ እውቀትን ለማሰብሰብ፣ እውቀትን እና በማወቅ መካከል መተላለፊያን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የውጤቶች ውጤቶች የTBS ዓይነቶች በአካባቢ ማተሚያዎች ላይ እና እውቀት-መጨረሻ እና እውቀት-አጨማሪው የRG መቀመጫዎች ማሳያ ያሳያል፤ በሰው አካባቢዎች እንደተረጋገጠ የዝግዝና የተለየ እና የተከተለውን መልስ ያሳያል፡፡ TBS ደግሞ አስተዋይ የሚያደርገውን የአውቀት ዶላር ያስጀምርበታል፡፡', 'az': 'Həmçinin məlumat kimi istifadə edilən elm insan danışmalarının anahtarıdır. Şimdiki nöral reaksiya nəzəriyyəti (RG) modelləri doğrudan cavab vermək üçün təhsil edilir, müəyyən edilməmiş imkansız bilgi tərk edir. Bu kağızda düşünmədən əvvəl danışmaq (TBS) təşkil edirik, ilk dış-dış təşkil bilgi ($think$) ilə təşkil edilən və bu bilgi təşkil etmək üçün istifadə edirik ($speak$). Biz mübahisə edirik ki, dışarıdakı imkanlı bilgi daha faydalı öyrənməyə imkanı verir, daha informativ cavab verər və daha açıq-aydın modelləri yaradır. Biz elm müəyyən edilmiş dialogları toplamaq üçün fərqli seçimləri analiz edirik, elm və dialoglar arasındakı dəyişiklik göstərir. Empirical results show TBS models outperform end-to-end and knowledge-increased RG baselines on most automatic metrics and generate more informative, specific and commonsense-following responses, as evaluated by human annotators. TBS həmçinin anlayış və zamanın 85%-i ilə müəyyən edilən elm dolarını ürəkləyir.', 'bn': 'সাধারণ মানুষের কথোপকথনের চাবিকা। বর্তমান নিউরেল প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রজন্ম (RG) মডেল সরাসরি প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করার জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যাতে  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা চিন্তা-ভাষণের পূর্বে (টিবিএস), প্রথম বিদেশী বিদেশী কমোনসেন্সের জ্ঞান জ্ঞানের জন্য একটি জেনারেলিভ উপায় উপস্থাপন করি এবং এই জ্ঞান ব্ আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে বাইরে প্রভাবিত জ্ঞানের সুযোগ আরো কার্যকর শিক্ষা দেয়, আরো তথ্যের প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করে আরো ব্যাখ্যা কর We analyze different choices to collect knowledge-aligned dialogues, represent implicit knowledge, and transition between knowledge and dialogues.  সম্মানিত ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে টিবিএস মডেল শেষ পর্যন্ত এবং জ্ঞান-বৃদ্ধির বেশীরভাগ স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেট্রিকের উপর জ্ঞানের বেসাইজেন্টের মাধ্যমে আরো তথ্য, বিশেষ এবং কমিনসে টিবিএস এছাড়াও জ্ঞান ডলার তৈরি করেছে যা বুঝতে পারে এবং সময়ের প্রায় ৮৫ শতাংশের সাথে কথোপকথনের সাথে যুক্ত।', 'cs': 'Implicitní znalosti, jako je zdravý rozum, jsou klíčem k plynulým lidským konverzacím. Současné modely generování neuronové odpovědi (RG) jsou trénovány tak, aby generovaly odpovědi přímo, přičemž vynechávají nestanovené implicitní znalosti. V tomto článku představujeme Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), generativní přístup k první externalizaci implicitních znalostí zdravého rozumu ($think$) a využití těchto znalostí k generování odpovědí ($speak$). Tvrdíme, že externalizace implicitních znalostí umožňuje efektivnější učení, vytváří informativnější reakce a umožňuje vysvětlitelnější modely. Analyzujeme různé možnosti pro sběr dialogů orientovaných na znalosti, reprezentaci implicitních znalostí a přechod mezi znalostmi a dialogy. Empirické výsledky ukazují, že TBS modely překonávají komplexní a znalostně rozšířené RG základní linie na většině automatických metrik a generují informativnější, specifické a zdravý rozum sledující odpovědi, jak je hodnoceno lidskými anotátory. TBS také generuje $knowledge$ který dává smysl a je relevantní pro dialog kolem 85% času', 'et': 'Kaudsed teadmised, näiteks terve mõistus, on võtmetähtsusega inimvestlustes. Praegused närvireaktsiooni genereerimise mudelid (RG) on koolitatud genereerima reaktsioone otse, jättes välja märkimata kaudsed teadmised. Käesolevas töös tutvustame mõtle-enne-rääkimist (TBS), generatiivset lähenemisviisi kaudsete ühismõistlike teadmiste välistamiseks ($think$) ja kasutame neid teadmisi vastuste genereerimiseks ($speak$). Väidame, et kaudsete teadmiste välistamine võimaldab tõhusamat õppimist, annab informatiivsemaid vastuseid ja võimaldab selgitada rohkem mudeleid. Analüüsime erinevaid valikuid, et koguda teadmistepõhiseid dialooge, esindada kaudseid teadmisi ning üleminekut teadmiste ja dialoogide vahel. Empiirilised tulemused näitavad, et TBS mudelid on enamikus automaatsetes mõõdikutes paremad kui lõpp-lõpuni ja teadmistega täiendatud RG lähtejooned ning tekitavad informatiivsemad, spetsiifilisemad ja mõistlikumad vastused, mida hindavad inimannotatorid. TBS genereerib ka $knowledge$, mis on mõistlik ja on dialoogi jaoks asjakohane umbes 85% ajast', 'bs': 'Implicitno znanje, poput zajedničkog smisla, je ključ za tekuće ljudske razgovore. Trenutni modeli generacije neuralnih odgovora (RG) obučeni su da bi izravno stvorili odgovore, izbjegavajući nepotkriveno implicitno znanje. U ovom papiru predstavljamo razmišljanje prije govora (TBS), generativni pristup prvom izvanrednom implicitnom znanju češće ($think$) i koristimo to znanje kako bi stvorili odgovore ($speak$). Tvrdimo da vanjska implicitna znanja omogućava učenje učinkovitije, proizvodi informativnije odgovore i omogućava objašnjivije modele. Analiziramo različite izbore za prikupljanje dijaloga usklađenih na znanje, predstavljamo implicitne znanje i prelaz između znanja i dijaloga. Empirički rezultati pokazuju da modeli TBS-a nadmađuju početne linije RG-a na većini automatskih metrika i stvaraju informativnije, specifičnije i slijedeće odgovore češće smisla, kako su procjenjivali ljudski annotatori. TBS također stvara znanje $ koje ima smisla i relevantno za dijalog oko 85% vremena', 'fi': 'Implisiittinen tieto, kuten terve järki, on avain sujuvaan ihmisten keskusteluun. Nykyiset neurovasteen generointimallit (RG) koulutetaan tuottamaan vastauksia suoraan, jättäen mainitsemattoman implisiittisen tiedon pois. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), generatiivinen lähestymistapa implisiittisen yleisen mielipiteen ulkoistamiseen ($think$) ja tämän tiedon käyttämiseen vastausten tuottamiseen ($speak$). Väitämme, että implisiittisen tiedon ulkoistaminen mahdollistaa tehokkaamman oppimisen, tuottaa informatiivisempia vastauksia ja mahdollistaa selittävimmät mallit. Analysoimme erilaisia valintoja kerätäksemme tietoon perustuvia dialogeja, esittääksemme implisiittistä tietoa sekä siirtyäksemme tiedon ja dialogien välillä. Empiiriset tulokset osoittavat, että TBS-mallit suoriutuvat end-to-end- ja knowledge-added RG-lähtölinjoista useimmissa automaattisissa mittareissa ja tuottavat informatiivisempia, spesifisempiä ja mielekkäämpiä vastauksia ihmisten huomautusten perusteella. TBS tuottaa myös $knowledge$ joka on järkevä ja merkityksellistä vuoropuheluun noin 85% ajasta', 'ca': 'El coneixement implícit, com el sentit comú, és clau per a les converses humanes fluides. Els models actuals de generació de resposta neuronal (RG) estan entrenats per generar respostes directament, omitind coneixements implícits no estatuats. In this paper, we present Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), a generative approach to first externalize implicit commonsense knowledge ($think$) and use this knowledge to generate responses ($speak$).  Afirmem que externalitzar el coneixement implícit permet aprendre més eficients, produeix respostes més informatives i permet models més explicables. Analitzem diferents opcions per recollir diàlegs allinjats al coneixement, representar coneixement implícit i transició entre coneixement i diàlegs. Els resultats empírics mostren que els models de TBS superen les línies de base de RG de final a final i augmentades pel coneixement en la majoria de mètriques automàtiques i generen respostes més informatives, específiques i comunes següents, tal i com es valoren els anotators humans. TBS també genera coneixement de dòlars que té sentit i és rellevant al diàleg al voltant del 85% del temps', 'jv': 'Lakaarané sing dipun, nganggo cah-cah dumadhi, kuwi sawar-cah dumadhi uwong. modells In this paper, we present The Mind-before-Speaking (PGS), a generic method to first externly use the underliness of logic underlined (like$do$jagger) and use this knownMonitor to generated responses ($Talk$). Awak dhéwé nglanggar barang nggawe barang nggawe barang pengguna luwih apik, iso nggawe barang informasi luwih apik lan iso nggawe model sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé énglek pernik-pernik nik kabèh kanggo ngékoké karo dialog sing nggawe ulé awak dhéwé, gambar keamanan ingkang dipepot kanggo ngerasakno karo dialog Rejection Tunisian Dolar kang dipunangé awakdhéwan dolar', 'ha': "Babu wani ilmi, kamar misali da kawaici, yana da mabuwãyar mazaɓa na ruwa. An sanar da misãlai masu motsi na yanzu yanzu (RG) dõmin ya ƙãga masu motsi dira, kuma ya bar da sanin da ba'a tsare ba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da Fikirci-Kayyan Ana yi magana (TBS), wata matsayi mai ɗabi'a zuwa na farkon ma'anar mataimaki na mataimaki ($za'a yi tunãni) kuma ka yi amfani da wannan ilmi dõmin ka sami jibar ($s). Tuna faɗa cẽwa, bakin da aka faɗa wani ilmi yana yarda da kunnuwa masu kai da amfani, kuma yana fitar da jibo masu labanci, kuma yana yarda da misãlai masu bayyana bayani. Ana yi anayya da zaɓaɓen dabam-daban dõmin mu sami zauren akwatin bayani masu da aka sani, kuma muna ƙayyade masani na da tsakanin ilmi da zauren akwatin bayani. Mataimakin Empirical na nuna misãlai TBS outrun ƙari-zuwa-ƙari kuma an ƙara-ilmi-gaske rubutun RG kan masu motsi farat-farat ɗaya kuma ya ƙãga wasu masu yiwuwa, da ƙayyade da masu amfani da wajen gayawa, da kuma masu sami da kommunce-daban, kamar an ƙaddara shi na matangarar mutane. TBS yana ƙara $ilimi na da kuma yana da amfani da zauren akwatin bayani taki 85% na lokacin", 'he': 'ידע משמעותי, כמו הגיון הנפשי, הוא מפתח לשיחות אנושיות נוזלות. דוגמנים של דור התגובה העצבית הנוכחית (RG) מאומנים לייצר תגובות ישירות, שוכחים מידע לא מוצדק. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים חשוב-לפני-דיבור (TBS), גישה דורתית כדי לראשונה להוציא את הידע המשותף היחודי (think$) והשתמש בידע הזה כדי ליצור תגובות (talk$). אנו מתווכחים כי חיצוני ידע מילוי מאפשר ללמוד יעיל יותר, יוצר תגובות מידעיות יותר, ואפשר דוגמנים מסבירים יותר. אנו מנתחים בחירות שונות לאסוף דיאלוגים מתאימים למידע, מייצגים ידע מרושע, ומעבר בין ידע ודיולוגים. התוצאות האימפריות מראות דוגמנים TBS יוצאים מעל ביצועים של סוף-סוף ו RG מוגברים על ידע בסיסים ברוב המטריקות האוטומטיות ויוצרים תגובות מידעיות יותר, ספציפיות וממשותפות, כפי שהערכו על ידי ציונים אנושיים. TBS גם יוצר ידע דולר שמגיע והוא רלוונטי לדיולוג בסביבות 85% מהזמן', 'sk': 'Implicitno znanje, kot je zdrava pamet, je ključnega pomena za tekoče človeške pogovore. Trenutni modeli za generiranje nevronskih odzivov (RG) so usposobljeni za neposredno generiranje odzivov, pri čemer se izpušča neizjavljeno implicitno znanje. V tem članku predstavljamo generativni pristop k zunanjemu implicitnemu splošnemu smislu znanja ($think$) in uporabi tega znanja za ustvarjanje odzivov ($speak$). Trdimo, da eksternalizacija implicitnega znanja omogoča učinkovitejše učenje, ustvarja bolj informativne odzive in omogoča bolj pojasnljive modele. Analiziramo različne izbire za zbiranje dialogov, usklajenih z znanjem, predstavljanje implicitnega znanja in prehod med znanjem in dialogi. Empirični rezultati kažejo, da so modeli TBS v večini samodejnih meritev bolj uspešni od konca do konca in z znanjem povečani RG osnovni vrstici in ustvarjajo bolj informativne, specifične in splošne odzive, kot jih ocenjujejo človeški opozorilniki. TBS ustvari tudi $knowledge$, ki je smiselno in je pomembno za dialog približno 85% časa', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཤེས་ཚད། དཔེར་ན། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མིན་པའི་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ལ་གཙོ་ཆེ་རེད། ད་ལྟོའི་ཀླད་སྒུལ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱ་རིམ(RG)མ་དབྱིབས་གཙོ་རིམ་པ་དེ་ཐད་ཀར་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In this paper, we present Think-Before-Speaking (TBS), a generative approach to first externalize implicit commonsense knowledge ($think$) and use this knowledge to generate responses ($speak$). ཕྱིར་འགོད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་དབྱིན་ཡོད་པ་དེ་སྟོན་པར་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཙམ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཡོད་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ཆ་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་པར་གདམ་ཁ་འདྲ་མི་འདྲ་ཞིབ་བསྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Empirical results show TBS models outperform end-to-end and knowledge-augmented RG baselines on most automatic metrics and generate more informative, specific, and commonsense-following responses, as evaluated by human annotators. Empirical results show TBS models outperform end-to-end and knowledge-augmented RG baselines on most automatic metrics and generate more informative, specific, and commonsense-following responses. TBS དེ་ཀྱང་དབྱིབས་ཤེས་ཚད་$ལས་ཀྱང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད། དུས་ཚོད་85% ཐད་མཚམས་ཁར་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation with Phrase-Level Universal Visual Representations', 'ar': 'هندسة مهايئ التدفق للترجمة الآلية غير الخاضعة للإشراف', 'fr': 'Architecture Flow-Adapter pour la traduction automatique non supervisée', 'es': 'Arquitectura de adaptador de flujo para traducción automática no supervisada', 'pt': 'Arquitetura de adaptador de fluxo para tradução automática não supervisionada', 'hi': 'प्रवाह एडाप्टर आर्किटेक्चर असुरक्षित मशीन अनुवाद के लिए', 'zh': '以无监机器翻译之流适配器架构', 'ja': '監督されていない機械翻訳のためのフローアダプターアーキテクチャ', 'ru': 'Архитектура Flow-Adapter для неконтролируемого машинного перевода', 'ga': "Ailtireacht Sreabh-Adapter d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Gan Maoirseacht", 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αρχιτεκτονική προσαρμογέων ροής για μη εποπτευόμενη μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Flow-Adapter architektúra a felügyelet nélküli gépi fordításhoz', 'it': 'Architettura Flow-Adapter per la traduzione automatica non controllata', 'kk': 'Сақталмаған машина аудармасының жұмыс адаптер архитектурасы', 'lt': 'Flow adapter Architecture for Unsupervised Machine Translation', 'mk': 'Архитектура на прилагодувачи за ненадгледуван превод на машина', 'mt': 'Arkitettura tal-Adattatur tal-Fluss għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Mhux Sorveljata', 'ms': 'Arkitektur Penyesuai-Alih untuk Terjemahan Mesin Tidak Dikawal', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുവാനുള്ള ഫ്ലൂ- ആഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിച്ചറ്', 'pl': 'Architektura adaptera przepływu dla tłumaczeń maszynowych nienadzorowanych', 'ro': 'Arhitectura adaptorului de flux pentru traducerea automată nesupravegheată', 'mn': 'Машины хөгжлийн хөгжлийн Flow-Adapter архитектур', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Flödesadapterarkitektur för oövervakad maskinöversättning', 'sr': 'Архитура пролетних адаптера за неподржану превод машина', 'so': 'Flow-Adapter Architecture for Unsupervised Machine Translation', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Flow-Adapter Architecture for Unsupervised Machine Translation', 'vi': 'Kiến trúc Hoa/ Thích hợp Máy dịch không giám sát', 'bg': 'Архитектура на адаптер за поток за машинен превод без надзор', 'hr': 'Arhitektura Flow-Adapter za neodržavanu prevodu stroja', 'nl': 'Flow-Adapter architectuur voor niet-gecontroleerde machinevertaling', 'da': 'Flow-Adapter-arkitektur til ukontrolleret maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Flow-Adapter Architektur für die nicht überwachte maschinelle Übersetzung', 'ko': '무감독기계 번역의 흐름 어댑터 체계 구조', 'fa': 'ساختار آداپتر فلوName', 'id': 'Arkitektur Flow-Adapter untuk Terjemahan Mesin Tidak Disupervisi', 'sw': 'Flow-Adapter Architecture for Unsupervised Machine Translation', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Mazmunlanmadyk Maşynyň terjimesi üçin Çaltylyk Adapter arhitektura', 'sq': 'Arkitektura e Adaptimit të Rrjedhjes për Trakthimin e Maquinës së Pambikqyrur', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'অনভার্ভার করা মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ফুল- অ্যাডাপ্টার আর্কিটেক্টার', 'bs': 'Arkitektura Flow-Adapter za neodređenu mašinu prevodu', 'cs': 'Architektura Flow-Adapter pro strojový překlad bez dohledu', 'ca': "L'arquitectura d'adaptador de flux per traducció de màquines no supervisada", 'et': 'Vooluadapteri arhitektuur järelevalveta masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Virtaussovittimen arkkitehtuuri valvomattomalle konekäännökselle', 'az': 'Mühafizə edilməmiş Makin Çeviri üçün Flow-Adapter Arhitektura', 'he': 'ארכיטקטורת מתאים לזרם לתרגום מכונות ללא שליטה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Flow-Adjuster architecture kanggo Majin Terjamahan Gak Cocok', 'sk': 'Arhitektura pretočnih adapterjev za strojno prevajanje brez nadzora', 'bo': 'Flow-Adapter Architecture for Unsupervised Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Multimodal machine translation (MMT) aims to improve neural machine translation (NMT) with additional visual information, but most existing MMT methods require paired input of source sentence and image, which makes them suffer from shortage of sentence-image pairs. In this paper, we propose a phrase-level retrieval-based method for MMT to get visual information for the source input from existing sentence-image data sets so that MMT can break the limitation of paired sentence-image input. Our method performs retrieval at the phrase level and hence learns visual information from pairs of source phrase and grounded region, which can mitigate data sparsity. Furthermore, our method employs the conditional variational auto-encoder to learn visual representations which can filter redundant visual information and only retain visual information related to the phrase. Experiments show that the proposed method significantly outperforms strong baselines on multiple MMT datasets, especially when the textual context is limited.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نقترح بنية محول التدفق لـ NMT غير الخاضع للإشراف. إنه يعزز تدفقات التطبيع لنمذجة توزيعات التمثيلات الكامنة على مستوى الجملة بشكل صريح ، والتي تُستخدم لاحقًا بالاقتران مع آلية الانتباه لمهمة الترجمة. المستجدات الأساسية في نموذجنا هي: (أ) التقاط تمثيلات الجمل الخاصة باللغة بشكل منفصل لكل لغة باستخدام تدفقات التطبيع و (ب) استخدام تحويل بسيط لهذه التمثيلات الكامنة للترجمة من لغة إلى أخرى. تسمح هذه البنية بالتدريب غير الخاضع للإشراف لكل لغة على حدة. في حين أن هناك عملًا مسبقًا على المتغيرات الكامنة لـ MT الخاضع للإشراف ، على حد علمنا ، فإن هذا هو العمل الأول الذي يستخدم المتغيرات الكامنة والتدفقات العادية لـ MT غير الخاضعة للإشراف. نحصل على نتائج تنافسية على العديد من معايير الترجمة الآلية غير الخاضعة للإشراف.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous proposons une architecture d'adaptateur de flux pour la NMT non supervisée. Il tire parti des flux de normalisation pour modéliser explicitement les distributions de représentations latentes au niveau de la phrase, qui sont ensuite utilisées conjointement avec le mécanisme d'attention pour la tâche de traduction. Les principales nouveautés de notre modèle sont\xa0: (a) la capture de représentations de phrases spécifiques à une langue séparément pour chaque langue à l'aide de flux de normalisation et (b) l'utilisation d'une simple transformation de ces représentations latentes pour la traduction d'une langue à une autre. Cette architecture permet une formation non supervisée de chaque langue indépendamment. Bien qu'il existe des travaux antérieurs sur les variables latentes pour la MT supervisée, à notre connaissance, il s'agit du premier travail qui utilise des variables latentes et normalise les flux pour la MT non supervisée. Nous obtenons des résultats compétitifs sur plusieurs benchmarks MT non supervisés.", 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, propomos uma arquitetura de adaptador de fluxo para NMT não supervisionado. Ele aproveita os fluxos de normalização para modelar explicitamente as distribuições de representações latentes em nível de sentença, que são subsequentemente usadas em conjunto com o mecanismo de atenção para a tarefa de tradução. As principais novidades do nosso modelo são: (a) capturar representações de sentenças específicas do idioma separadamente para cada idioma usando fluxos normalizadores e (b) usar uma transformação simples dessas representações latentes para traduzir de um idioma para outro. Essa arquitetura permite o treinamento não supervisionado de cada idioma de forma independente. Embora haja trabalhos anteriores sobre variáveis latentes para MT supervisionado, até onde sabemos, este é o primeiro trabalho que usa variáveis latentes e fluxos normalizadores para MT não supervisionado. Obtemos resultados competitivos em vários benchmarks de MT não supervisionados.', 'es': 'En este trabajo, proponemos una arquitectura de adaptador de flujo para NMT no supervisada. Aprovecha la normalización de los flujos para modelar explícitamente las distribuciones de las representaciones latentes a nivel de oración, que posteriormente se utilizan junto con el mecanismo de atención para la tarea de traducción. Las principales novedades de nuestro modelo son: (a) capturar representaciones de oraciones específicas del idioma por separado para cada idioma mediante la normalización de flujos y (b) utilizar una transformación simple de estas representaciones latentes para traducir de un idioma a otro. Esta arquitectura permite la formación sin supervisión de cada idioma de forma independiente. Si bien existe un trabajo previo sobre variables latentes para la MT supervisada, según nuestro conocimiento, este es el primer trabajo que utiliza variables latentes y la normalización de los flujos para la MT no supervisada. Obtenemos resultados competitivos en varios puntos de referencia de MT no supervisados.', 'ja': 'この作業では、監督されていないNMTのためのフローアダプタアーキテクチャを提案します。それは、文レベルの潜在表現の分布を明示的にモデル化するために正規化フローを活用し、これらはその後、翻訳タスクの注意メカニズムと組み合わせて使用される。私たちのモデルの主な新規性は、(a)正規化フローを使用して各言語の言語固有の文章表現を個別にキャプチャすることと、(b)ある言語から別の言語への翻訳のためにこれらの潜在的な表現の単純な変換を使用することです。このアーキテクチャでは、各言語を独立して、監督なしでトレーニングすることができます。監督されたMTの潜在変数に関する以前の作業がありますが、私たちの知る限りでは、これは潜在変数を使用し、監督されていないMTのフローを正規化する最初の作業です。私たちは、いくつかの監督されていないMTベンチマークで競争的な結果を得ています。', 'zh': '于是举无监NMT之适配器架构。 以规范化流显式拟句级潜布,随与译务合用也。 凡新之要,(a)用规范化流各得语言特定句,及(b)用此潜移一语翻译成别语也。 此架构许专对每语无监督训练。 虽前已究于监机器翻译之变量,但据吾所知,是一于无监机器翻译用潜于变量归一化流也。 数无监督机器翻译准试有竞争力。', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम असुरक्षित एनएमटी के लिए एक प्रवाह-एडाप्टर आर्किटेक्चर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह वाक्य-स्तर के अव्यक्त अभ्यावेदन के वितरण को स्पष्ट रूप से मॉडल करने के लिए प्रवाह को सामान्य करने का लाभ उठाता है, जो बाद में अनुवाद कार्य के लिए ध्यान तंत्र के साथ संयोजन के रूप में उपयोग किया जाता है। हमारे मॉडल की प्राथमिक नवीनताएं हैं: (ए) प्रवाह को सामान्य करने का उपयोग करके प्रत्येक भाषा के लिए अलग-अलग भाषा-विशिष्ट वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व पर कब्जा करना और (बी) एक भाषा से दूसरी भाषा में अनुवाद करने के लिए इन अव्यक्त प्रतिनिधित्वों के एक सरल परिवर्तन का उपयोग करना। यह वास्तुकला स्वतंत्र रूप से प्रत्येक भाषा के असुरक्षित प्रशिक्षण के लिए अनुमति देती है। जबकि पर्यवेक्षित एमटी के लिए अव्यक्त चर पर पूर्व काम है, हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, यह पहला काम है जो अव्यक्त चर का उपयोग करता है और असुरक्षित एमटी के लिए प्रवाह को सामान्य करता है। हम कई असुरक्षित एमटी बेंचमार्क पर प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы предлагаем архитектуру потока-адаптера для неконтролируемой NMT. Он использует нормализующие потоки для явного моделирования распределений скрытых представлений на уровне предложений, которые впоследствии используются в сочетании с механизмом внимания для задачи перевода. Основными новинками нашей модели являются: (а) захват языковых представлений предложений отдельно для каждого языка с использованием нормализующих потоков и (б) использование простой трансформации этих скрытых представлений для перевода с одного языка на другой. Эта архитектура позволяет осуществлять самостоятельное обучение на каждом языке. Несмотря на то, что ранее велась работа над латентными переменными для контролируемого MT, насколько нам известно, это первая работа, в которой используются латентные переменные и нормализуются потоки для неконтролируемого MT. Мы получаем конкурентные результаты по нескольким неконтролируемым контрольным показателям MT.', 'ga': 'San obair seo, molaimid ailtireacht sreafa-oiriúntóra do NMT gan mhaoirseacht. Déanann sé sreafaí normalaithe a ghiaráil chun dáileadh na léirithe folaigh ar leibhéal na habairte a shamhaltú go sainráite, a úsáidtear ina dhiaidh sin in éineacht leis an meicníocht aird don tasc aistriúcháin. Is iad príomhnúíosacha ár múnla ná: (a) léiriú abairtí a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga a ghabháil ar leithligh do gach teanga ag baint úsáide as sreafaí normalaithe agus (b) ag baint úsáide as claochlú simplí ar na léirithe folaigh seo le haistriú ó theanga amháin go teanga eile. Ligeann an ailtireacht seo oiliúint neamhspleách a dhéanamh ar gach teanga gan mhaoirseacht. Cé go bhfuil obair roimh ré ar athróga folaigh le haghaidh MT maoirsithe, ar feadh ár n-eolas, is é seo an chéad obair a úsáideann athróga folaigh agus normalú sreafaí le haghaidh MT gan mhaoirseacht. Faighimid torthaí iomaíocha ar roinnt tagarmharcanna MT gan mhaoirseacht.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában a felügyelet nélküli NMT áramlási adapter architektúráját javasoljuk. A normalizáló folyamatokat kihasználja a mondatszintű látens reprezentációk eloszlásának explicit modellezésére, amelyeket később a fordítási feladat figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmusával együtt használnak. Modellünk elsődleges újdonságai a következők: (a) nyelvspecifikus mondatábrázolásokat rögzítjük külön-külön minden nyelvre normalizáló folyamatok segítségével, és (b) ezen látens reprezentációk egyszerű átalakításával fordítjuk egyik nyelvről a másikra. Ez az architektúra lehetővé teszi az egyes nyelvek felügyelet nélküli képzését önállóan. Bár a felügyelt MT látens változóival kapcsolatos előzetes munka folyik, legjobb tudásunk szerint ez az első olyan munka, amely látens változókat használ fel, és normalizálja az áramlásokat a felügyelet nélküli MT esetében.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική προσαρμογέα ροής για μη επιτηρημένο NMT. Χρησιμοποιεί εξομάλυνση των ροών για να μοντελοποιήσει ρητά τις διανομές λανθάνουσας αναπαραστάσεων σε επίπεδο πρότασης, οι οποίες στη συνέχεια χρησιμοποιούνται σε συνδυασμό με τον μηχανισμό προσοχής για την εργασία μετάφρασης. Οι βασικές καινοτομίες του μοντέλου μας είναι: (α) η καταγραφή γλωσσικών αναπαραστάσεων προτάσεων χωριστά για κάθε γλώσσα χρησιμοποιώντας κανονικές ροές και (β) η χρήση μιας απλής μετατροπής αυτών των λανθάνοντων αναπαραστάσεων για τη μετάφραση από τη μία γλώσσα στην άλλη. Η αρχιτεκτονική αυτή επιτρέπει την ανεξέλεγκτη εκπαίδευση κάθε γλώσσας. Ενώ υπάρχει προηγούμενη εργασία σχετικά με λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές για εποπτευόμενες ΜΤ, από όσο γνωρίζουμε, αυτή είναι η πρώτη εργασία που χρησιμοποιεί λανθάνουσες μεταβλητές και ομαλοποίηση ροών για μη εποπτευόμενες ΜΤ.', 'it': "In questo lavoro, proponiamo un'architettura di adattatore di flusso per NMT non supervisionato. Sfrutta i flussi normalizzanti per modellare esplicitamente le distribuzioni delle rappresentazioni latenti a livello di frase, che vengono successivamente utilizzate in combinazione con il meccanismo di attenzione per l'attività di traduzione. Le principali novità del nostro modello sono: (a) catturare separatamente le rappresentazioni di frasi specifiche per ogni lingua utilizzando flussi normalizzanti e (b) utilizzare una semplice trasformazione di queste rappresentazioni latenti per tradurre da una lingua all'altra. Questa architettura consente una formazione non supervisionata di ogni lingua in modo indipendente. Mentre esiste un precedente lavoro sulle variabili latenti per MT supervisionata, per quanto ne sappiamo, questo è il primo lavoro che utilizza variabili latenti e normalizza i flussi per MT non supervisionata. Otteniamo risultati competitivi su diversi benchmark MT non supervisionati.", 'lt': 'Šiame darbe siūlome srautų adaptatoriaus architektūrą, skirtą nepastebimam NMT. Ji padeda normalizuoti srautus, kad būtų aiškiai modeliuojamas paslėptų reprezentacijų bausmės lygiu paskirstymas, kuris vėliau naudojamas kartu su vertimo užduoties dėmesio mechanizmu. Pagrindinės mūsų modelio naujovės yra: a) kiekvienai kalbai skirtų sakinių atvaizdavimas atskirai, naudojant normalizuojančius srautus, ir b) paprastas šių latentinių atvaizdavimų perskaičiavimas vertimui iš vienos kalbos į kitą. Ši architektūra leidžia nepriklausomai mokyti kiekvieną kalbą be priežiūros. Nors atliekamas ankstesnis darbas dėl latentinių kintamųjų prižiūrima MT, kiek žinome, tai yra pirmasis darbas, kuriuo naudojami latentieji kintamieji ir normalizuojami srautai nepažiūrima MT.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа, предложуваме архитектура за пристап на тек за ненадгледувана НМТ. Истиот го користи нормализирањето на тековите за експлицитно да ги моделира дистрибуциите на тајните претставувања на нивото на речениците, кои потоа се користат во врска со механизмот на внимание за преведувањето на задачата. The primary novelties of our model are: (a) capturing language-specific sentence representations separately for each language using normalizing flows and (b) using a simple transformation of these latent representations for translating from one language to another.  Оваа архитектура овозможува ненадгледувана обука на секој јазик независно. Додека постои претходна работа на лантни променливи за надгледуван МТ, за најдобро од нашето знаење, ова е првата работа која користи лантни променливи и нормализира текови за ненадгледуван МТ.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan arkitektur penyesuaian aliran untuk NMT yang tidak diawasi. Ia menggunakan aliran normalisasi untuk secara eksplicit model distribusi perwakilan tertutup aras kalimat, yang kemudian digunakan bersama dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk tugas terjemahan. Kebaru utama model kita ialah: (a) menangkap perwakilan kalimat khusus bahasa secara terpisah untuk setiap bahasa menggunakan aliran normalisasi dan (b) menggunakan pengubahan sederhana perwakilan tersembunyi untuk menerjemahkan dari satu bahasa ke bahasa lain. Arkitektur ini membolehkan latihan tiap- tiap bahasa tidak diawasi secara independen. Sementara terdapat kerja sebelumnya pada pembolehubah tersembunyi untuk MT yang diawasi, untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah kerja pertama yang menggunakan pembolehubah tersembunyi dan mengawal aliran untuk MT yang tidak diawasi. Kami mendapat keputusan kompetitif pada beberapa tanda referensi MT yang tidak diawasi.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მინდომებით NMT-ის არსპერვისტრიქტირების აღქტიქტირება. ეს ნორმალურად გამოიყენება წესების გარემოქმების გარემოქმების გარემოქმების გარემოქმებისთვის, რომელიც შემდეგ გამოყენებულია შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ ჩვენი მოდელის პირველი პრომენტები არის: a) ყველა ენის განსაკუთრებული სიტყვების განსაკუთრებების განსაკუთრებების განსაკუთრებით ყოველ ენის გამოყენებაში ნორმალურიზაციას და b) გამოყენება მარტივი განსაკუთრებ ამ აქტიქტიკურაში ყველა ენის განსხვავებულად განსხვავებულ განსხვავებას შესაძლებელია. მაგრამ არსებობს პირველი მუშაობა, რომელიც ჩვენი ცნობილის უკეთესი მსოფლიოსთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთ', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത NMT നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ഒരു നീര്\u200dത്ത-അഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ക അത് വാക്ക്-ലേറ്റ് നേരത്തെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വ്യക്തമായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണമാക്കുന്നു. അതിനുശേഷം  നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രധാന നോവലുകള്\u200d: (a) ഭാഷ- പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ പിടികൂടുന്നത് ഓരോ ഭാഷയ്ക്കും സാധാരണമാക്കുന്ന പൂക്കള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചും ബി ഓരോ ഭാഷ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി സൂക്ഷിക്കാത്ത പരിശീലനത്തിനായി ഈ ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് ജോലിയുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിലേക്ക് ഇതാണ് ആദ്യത്തെ ജോലി മാറ്റുന്നത്, സംരക്ഷിക്കാത്ത മെമ്', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol, nipproponu arkitettura ta’ adattatur tal-fluss għal NMT mhux sorveljat. Jixpruna n-normalizzazzjoni tal-flussi biex jimmudellaw espliċitament id-distribuzzjonijiet tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet latenti fil-livell tas-sentenza, li sussegwentement jintużaw flimkien mal-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni għall-kompitu ta’ traduzzjoni. L-innovazzjonijiet primarji tal-mudell tagħna huma: (a) il-kisba ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ sentenzi speċifiċi għall-lingwa separatament għal kull lingwa bl-użu ta’ flussi normalizzanti u (b) l-użu ta’ trasformazzjoni sempliċi ta’ dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet moħbija għat-traduzzjoni minn lingwa għal oħra. Din l-arkitettura tippermetti taħriġ mhux sorveljat ta’ kull lingwa b’mod indipendenti. Filwaqt li hemm xogħol minn qabel fuq varjabbli moħbija għal MT sorveljat, għall-aħjar mill-għarfien tagħna, dan huwa l-ewwel xogħol li juża varjabbli moħbija u n-normalizzazzjoni tal-flussi għal MT mhux sorveljat.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде, NMT бағытталмаған жұмыс адаптер архитектурасын ұсынамыз. Бұл сұлбаларды көзгерту үшін көзгерту үшін сұлбаның соңғы деңгейіндегі тапсырмалардың үлестірімін түсіндіру үшін көзгертеді. Бұл соңғы уақытта аудару тапсырмасының механ Біздің үлгіміздің негізгі романдалары: a) тілден бір тілден бір тілде аудару үшін қарапайым түрлендіру үшін әрбір тіл үшін әрбір тіл үшін бөлек түрлендіру және b) қарапайым түрлендіру үшін. Бұл архитектура әрбір тілді тәуелсіз оқытуға мүмкіндік береді. Алдыңғы MT бақылау үшін, біліміздің ең жақсы мәліметімізге келесі айнымалылықтар жұмыс бар, бұл келесі айнымалылықтарды қолданатын жұмыс және MT бақылау үшін жұмысты нормализациялауға болады. Біз бірнеше MT бақылау', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy proponujemy architekturę adaptera przepływu dla NMT bez nadzoru. Wykorzystuje normalizujące przepływy do wyraźnego modelowania rozkładów utajonych reprezentacji na poziomie zdań, które są następnie wykorzystywane w połączeniu z mechanizmem uwagi na zadanie tłumaczeniowe. Podstawowymi nowościami naszego modelu są: (a) przechwytywanie specyficznych językowych reprezentacji zdań osobno dla każdego języka przy użyciu normalizujących przepływów oraz (b) wykorzystanie prostej transformacji tych utajonych reprezentacji do tłumaczenia z jednego języka na drugi. Architektura ta pozwala na niezależne szkolenie każdego języka bez nadzoru. Chociaż istnieją wcześniejsze prace nad zmiennymi utajonymi dla nadzorowanej MT, według naszej najlepszej wiedzy, jest to pierwsza praca, która wykorzystuje zmienne utajone i normalizuje przepływy dla nienadzorowanej MT. Uzyskujemy konkurencyjne wyniki na kilku nienadzorowanych MT benchmarkach.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o arhitectură adaptoare de flux pentru NMT nesupravegheat. Folosește fluxurile de normalizare pentru a modela în mod explicit distribuțiile reprezentărilor latente la nivel de frază, care sunt ulterior utilizate împreună cu mecanismul de atenție pentru sarcina de traducere. Noutățile principale ale modelului nostru sunt: (a) captarea reprezentărilor propozițiilor specifice limbajului separat pentru fiecare limbă folosind fluxuri de normalizare și (b) utilizarea unei simple transformări a acestor reprezentări latente pentru traducerea dintr-o limbă în alta. Această arhitectură permite instruirea nesupravegheată a fiecărei limbi în mod independent. Deși există lucrări anterioare cu privire la variabilele latente pentru MT supravegheate, din câte știm, aceasta este prima lucrare care utilizează variabile latente și normalizează fluxurile pentru MT nesupravegheate. Obținem rezultate competitive pe mai multe criterii MT nesupravegheate.', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu predlažemo arhitekturu za nepotrebnu NMT-u. To utiče na normalizovanje tokova da biste izrazili raspodjele poslednjih predstavljanja na razini rečenica, koje se nakon toga koriste zajedno sa mehanizam pažnje za prevođenje zadataka. Glavni romani našeg model a su: a) hvatanje predstavljanja jezika određene rečenice odvojeno za svaki jezik koristeći normalizovanje tokova i b) koristeći jednostavnu transformaciju ovih poslednjih predstavljanja za prevod od jednog jezika na drugi. Ova arhitektura omogućava neodređenu obuku svakog jezika nezavisno. Iako postoji prethodni rad o latentnim promjenama za nadzorne MT-e, do najboljeg znanja, to je prvi rad koji koristi latentne promjene i normalizira toke za neodržavane MT-e. Dobijamo konkurentne rezultate na nekoliko neodržavanih MT kriterija.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරවාහනය කරන්නේ නැහැ NMT වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවාහනයක් සඳහා ස්ථාපනය කරන්න. ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න, ඒක පස්සේ පස්සේ භාවිත විදියට භාවිත අපේ මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානයක් තමයි: (a) භාෂාව විශේෂ ප්\u200dරධානයක් අරගෙන හැම භාෂාව භාවිතා මේ ස්ථාපනය සඳහා හැම භාෂාවක්ම ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් නැති ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා. MT නිරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පළවෙනි වෙනස් විදියට, අපේ දන්නවට හොඳම විදියට, මේක පළවෙනි වෙනස් විදියට භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් වැඩය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට MT නිරී', 'so': 'Markaas waxan, waxaynu horumarinaynaa dhismaha adapter oo aan la ilaalinayn NMT. Waxay u fidiyaa ubaxyada sida caadiga ah si ay u muuqato qaybinta heerka ugu dambeeya, taasoo dabadeedna lagu isticmaali karo iskuul-dhigista shaqada turjumaadda. Qoraalka ugu horeeya ee modellkayaga waa: (a) ku qabsashada noocyo gaar ah oo u gaar ah luqad kasta si loo isticmaalo ubaxyada caadi ah iyo (b) si fudud u beddelasha noocyadan ugu dambeeyey si loo turjumo af kaliya ilaa mid. Baabuurkaas wuxuu si xor ah u heli karaa waxbarasho aan la sameyn karin luqad kasta. Inta lagu jiro shuqul ka horeysa ka shaqeynta bedelayaasha ugu dambeeya ee la ilaaliyey MT, tan ugu wanaagsan aqoontayada, kanu waa shaqada ugu horeeya ee isticmaala beddelka ugu dambeeya iyo ubaxyada si caadi ah oo aan la ilaalinayn MT. Waxaynu helaynaa resulto khiyaano ah oo ku saabsan dhawr bangiyada MT oo aan la ilaalinayn.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын хувьд бид NMT-ийн хувьд урсгалын адаптер архитектурыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь урсгалыг тодорхой хэлбэрээр загварчлах боломжтой болгодог. Үүний дараа нь хөрөнгө оруулах үйл ажиллагааны анхаарал механизмтай холбоотой болно. Бидний загварын анхны зохиолууд нь: a) хэл бүрт тодорхой өгүүлбэр илэрхийлэл авах нь хэл бүрт нормалчлах урсгалыг ашиглаж, б) эдгээр сүүлийн илэрхийлэл дээр нэг хэл руу орлуулахын тулд энгийн өөрчлөлт ашиглаж байна. Энэ архитектур хэл бүрт тусгаарлагдахгүй суралцах боломжтой. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй хүртэл, MT-ийн хамгийн сүүлийн хувьсагчдын тухай өмнө ажиллаж байгаа ч, энэ нь сүүлийн хувьсагчдыг ашиглаж, хөдөлгөөнгүй MT-ийн хувьсагчдын тулд урсгал хөдөлгөөн хэрэглэдэг анхны ажил юм.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete föreslår vi en flödesadapterarkitektur för oövervakad NMT. Den utnyttjar normaliseringsflöden för att explicit modellera fördelningarna av latenta representationer på meningsnivå, som senare används tillsammans med uppmärksamhetsmekanismen för översättningsuppgiften. De främsta nyheterna i vår modell är: (a) fånga språkspecifika meningsrepresentationer separat för varje språk med hjälp av normaliserande flöden och (b) använda en enkel transformation av dessa latenta representationer för översättning från ett språk till ett annat. Denna arkitektur möjliggör oövervakad utbildning av varje språk oberoende. Även om det finns tidigare arbete med latenta variabler för övervakad MT, så vitt vi vet, är detta det första arbetet som använder latenta variabler och normaliserar flöden för obevakad MT. Vi får konkurrenskraftiga resultat på flera obevakade MT-riktmärken.', 'no': 'I denne arbeida foreslår vi ein flyadapteringsarkitektur for ulike NMT-arkitektur. Det leverer normalisering av flukt til å eksplisisere modeller distribusjonane av setningsnivå siste representasjonar, som så blir brukt i samband med oppmerksmekanismen for oversettelsoppgåva. Den primære romaniteten i modellen vårt er: a) å ta opp språkspesifiserte setningar for kvar språk med normalisering av flug og b) ved å bruka ein enkel transformering av desse siste representasjonane for å oversette frå ein språk til ein annan. Denne arkitekturen lèt deg ikkje oppretta opplæring av kvar språk uavhengig. Mens det finst førre arbeid på latente variablar for oversikt av MT, til det beste av vårt kunnskap, er det første arbeidet som brukar latente variablar og normaliserer flyttar for ulike MT. Vi får konkurentiv resultat på fleire ulike måtar.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத NMT க்கு ஒரு flow-adapter architecture பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். மொழிபெயர்ப்பு செயலுக்கான கவனம் முறைமையுடன் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. எங்கள் மாதிரியின் முதன்மையான புத்தகங்கள் என்னவென்றால்: (a) மொழியிலிருந்து மொழியிலிருந்து மற்றொரு மொழிக்கும் மொழியிலிருந்து மொழிகளை மாற்ற இந்த உருவாக்கி ஒவ்வொரு மொழியின் தனிப்பயனாக சேமிக்கப்படாத பயிற்சிக்கு அனுமதிக்கிறது. முன்னால் MT மாறிகள் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்பட்ட மாறிகளில் செயல் இருக்கிறது, எங்கள் அறிவு சிறந்ததுக்கு, இது தான் சமீபத்திய மாறிகளைப் பயன்படுத்தும் மாறிகளைப் பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத', 'ur': 'اس کام میں ہم ایک فلوٹ اڈپٹر معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو غیر پاکیزہ NMT کے لئے ہے۔ اس نے جہنم کی جہنم کو مضبوط طریقے سے موڈل کرنے کے لئے لکھ دیا ہے کہ جہنم-سطح کے اگلے نمونات کی تقسیم کریں، جو اس کے بعد ترجمہ کے کام کے لئے توجه کے مکانیسم کے ساتھ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. ہمارے مدل کی اولین نوائی یہ ہیں: a) ہر زبان کے لئے مختلف زبان کے مطابق زبان کے مطابق زبان کے مطابق مختلف مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق اور (b) ان یہ معماری ہر زبان کی آموزش ناپابندی کی اجازت دیتی ہے۔ اگرچہ ہمارے بہترین علم کے لئے لاٹینٹ ویرئیٹ کے بارے میں پہلے کام ہوتا ہے، یہ پہلی کام ہے جو لاٹینٹ ویرئیٹ استعمال کرتا ہے اور غیر قابل MT کے لئے فلاؤں کو عامل کرتا ہے. ہم بہت سے غیر قابل قابل قابل قابل مقابلہ کے نتائج حاصل کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "In this work, we propose a flow-adapter architecture for unsupervised NMT.  Name Modemizning asosiy novellari: (a) har bir tildan boshqa tilga tarjima qilish uchun har bir tillar uchun bir xil so'zlarni ajratish va (b) bilan bir tildan boshqa tilga tarjima qilish uchun oddiy oʻzgarishdan foydalanish mumkin. Bu arxivlagich har bir tillar qoʻllanmagan taʼminlovchiga ruxsat beradi. Yaqinda MT'ning eng yaxshi aniqligimiz uchun eng yaxshi o'zgarishlarda ishlayotgan paytlarni oldin bo'lgan paydo bo'ladi, bu biz birinchi vazifani keyingi o'zgarishlardan foydalanuvchi va xavob berilmagan MT'ga qo'llanmagan narsalarni bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một công trình phục hồi NMT không giám sát. Nó điều khiển các dòng chảy bình thường để mô tả rõ ràng các phân phát các biểu biểu hiện dấu ấn ở mức án, mà sau đó được sử dụng cùng với cơ chế tập trung cho nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển. Những phiên b ản chính của mẫu này là: a) Phân tích các biểu tượng ngôn ngữ cụ thể riêng cho mỗi ngôn ngữ dùng các dòng ổn định và (b) sử dụng một sự biến đổi đơn giản của các biểu tượng tiềm ẩn để dịch từ ngôn ngữ này sang ngôn ngữ khác. Kiến trúc này cho phép độc lập huấn luyện ngôn ngữ nào không được giám sát. Trong khi có các biến số tiềm năng bị giám sát trên kênh MTV, theo như chúng ta biết, đây là công việc đầu tiên sử dụng các biến số tiềm ẩn và làm bình thường các dòng chảy của kênh không giám sát. Chúng ta có kết quả cạnh tranh trên nhiều tiêu chuẩn MTV không giám sát.', 'bg': 'В тази работа предлагаме архитектура на поток-адаптер за ненадзорни НМТ. Той използва нормализиращите потоци, за да моделира изрично разпределенията на латентните представяния на ниво изречение, които впоследствие се използват заедно с механизма за внимание за задачата за превод. Основните новости на нашия модел са: (а) улавяне на специфични за езика изображения на изречения отделно за всеки език чрез нормализиращи потоци и (б) използване на проста трансформация на тези латентни изображения за превод от един език на друг. Тази архитектура позволява самостоятелно обучение на всеки език без надзор. Въпреки че има предишна работа по латентни променливи за надзорни МТ, доколкото знаем, това е първата работа, която използва латентни променливи и нормализира потоците за ненадзорни МТ. Получаваме конкурентни резултати по няколко ненадзорни МТ бенчмарка.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu predlažemo arhitekturu adapter a toka za nepotrebnu NMT-u. To utječe na normalizaciju toka kako bi se pojasno modeliralo raspodjele poslednjih predstavljanja na razini rečenica, koje se nakon toga koriste zajedno s mehanizam pažnje za prevod zadataka. Glavne novine našeg model a su: a) uhvatiti predstave za jezik posebne rečenice odvojeno za svaki jezik koristeći normalizaciju toka i b) koristeći jednostavnu transformaciju ovih poslednjih predstavljanja za prevod od jednog jezika na drugi. Ova arhitektura omogućava neovisno obuku svakog jezika. Iako postoji prethodni rad o latentnim promjenama nadziranim MT-om, najboljem od naših znanja, to je prvi rad koji koristi latentne promjene i normalizira toke za neodržavane MT-e. Dobijamo konkurentne rezultate na nekoliko neodržavanih kriterija MT-a.', 'nl': 'In dit werk stellen we een flow-adapter architectuur voor niet-begeleide NMT voor. Het maakt gebruik van normaliserende stromen om expliciet de verdelingen van latente representaties op zinsniveau te modelleren, die vervolgens worden gebruikt in combinatie met het aandachtsmechanisme voor de vertaaltaak. De primaire nieuwigheden van ons model zijn: (a) het afzonderlijk vastleggen van taalspecifieke zinnrepresentaties voor elke taal met behulp van normaliserende stromen en (b) het gebruik van een eenvoudige transformatie van deze latente representaties voor het vertalen van de ene taal naar de andere. Deze architectuur maakt het mogelijk om elke taal onafhankelijk te trainen zonder toezicht. Hoewel er al eerder gewerkt is aan latente variabelen voor begeleide MT, is dit voor zover wij weten het eerste werk dat latente variabelen en normaliserende stromen gebruikt voor niet-begeleide MT. We verkrijgen concurrerende resultaten op verschillende niet-begeleide MT benchmarks.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde foreslår vi en flowadapter arkitektur til ikke-overvåget NMT. Det udnytter normaliserende strømme til eksplicit at modellere fordelingen af latente repræsentationer på sætningsniveau, som efterfølgende bruges sammen med opmærksomhedsmekanismen til oversættelsesopgaven. De primære nyheder i vores model er: (a) at indfange sprogspecifikke sætningsrepræsentationer separat for hvert sprog ved hjælp af normaliserende flows og (b) at bruge en simpel transformation af disse latente repræsentationer til oversættelse fra et sprog til et andet. Denne arkitektur giver mulighed for uafhængig uddannelse af hvert sprog. Mens der tidligere er arbejdet med latente variabler for overvåget MT, så vidt vi ved, er dette det første arbejde, der anvender latente variabler og normaliserer strømme for ikke-overvåget MT. Vi opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater på flere ikke-overvågede MT benchmarks.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine Strﾃｶmungsadapterarchitektur fﾃｼr unﾃｼberwachte NMT vor. Es nutzt normalisierende Strﾃｶme, um explizit die Verteilungen latenter Reprﾃ､sentationen auf Satzebene zu modellieren, die anschlieﾃ歹nd in Verbindung mit dem Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus fﾃｼr die ﾃ彙ersetzungsaufgabe verwendet werden. Die primﾃ､ren Neuerungen unseres Modells sind: (a) die Erfassung sprachspezifischer Satzdarstellungen fﾃｼr jede Sprache durch normalisierende Strﾃｶme getrennt und (b) die einfache Transformation dieser latenten Darstellungen fﾃｼr die ﾃ彙ersetzung von einer Sprache in eine andere. Diese Architektur ermﾃｶglicht ein unbeaufsichtigtes Training jeder Sprache unabhﾃ､ngig voneinander. Obwohl bereits an latenten Variablen fﾃｼr ﾃｼberwachte MT gearbeitet wurde, ist dies nach bestem Wissen die erste Arbeit, die latente Variablen und Normalisierungsstrﾃｶme fﾃｼr unbeaufsichtigte MT verwendet. Wir erhalten wettbewerbsfﾃ､hige Ergebnisse auf mehreren unbeaufsichtigten MT Benchmarks.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan arsitektur aliran-adapter untuk NMT yang tidak diawasi. Ini menggunakan aliran normalisasi untuk secara eksplicit model distribusi dari representation latent tingkat kalimat, yang kemudian digunakan bersama dengan mekanisme perhatian untuk tugas terjemahan. Novelitas utama dari model kita adalah: (a) menangkap representation kalimat spesifik bahasa secara terpisah untuk setiap bahasa menggunakan aliran normalisasi dan (b) menggunakan transformasi sederhana dari representation latent ini untuk menerjemahkan dari satu bahasa ke bahasa lain. Arkitektur ini memungkinkan pelatihan tidak diawasi setiap bahasa secara independen. Sementara ada pekerjaan sebelumnya pada variabel latent untuk MT yang diawasi, menurut pengetahuan terbaik kita, ini adalah pekerjaan pertama yang menggunakan variabel latent dan menganalisasi aliran untuk MT yang tidak diawasi. kita mendapatkan hasil kompetitif pada beberapa benchmark MT yang tidak diawasi.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما یک معماری قابل تغییر جریان برای NMT ناپایدار پیشنهاد می کنیم. این جریان\u200cها را برای توزیع کردن نمایش\u200cهای اخیر طبقه\u200cی جمله\u200cها به طور کامل مدل می\u200cدهد که بعدش در کنار مکانیسم توجه برای کار ترجمه استفاده می\u200cشوند. نوشته های اولیه مدل ما این است: a) جمله\u200cهای مخصوص زبان برای هر زبان با استفاده از جریان\u200cهای عادی و b) با استفاده از تغییر ساده\u200cای از این نمایش\u200cهای اخیر برای ترجمه از یک زبان به دیگر. این معماری اجازه می دهد که تمرین ناپایداری از هر زبان تنها باشد. در حالی که کار پیشینیان روی تغییرات latent برای MT تحت نظر، به بهترین دانش ما وجود دارد، این اولین کاری است که از تغییرات latent استفاده می کند و جریان را برای MT غیرقابل تحت نظر قرار می دهد. ما نتایج رقابتی را در چندین تغییرات MT غیرقابل تحت نظر می گیریم.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리는 무감독 NMT에 사용되는 흐르는 어댑터 체계 구조를 제시했다.번역 과정에서 잠재적인 주의 흐름 모델과 잠재적인 주의 흐름 모델을 결합하여 사용한다.우리 모델의 주요 혁신은 (a) 사용 규범화 흐름이 각각 언어마다 특정한 문장 표시를 포착하고 (b) 이러한 잠재적 표시를 사용하는 간단한 전환을 한 언어에서 다른 언어로 번역하는 데 있다.이런 체계 구조는 모든 언어에 대해 독립적인 무감독 교육을 허용한다.이전에 감독기계번역의 잠재적 변수에 대한 연구가 있었지만, 우리가 알기로는 잠재적 변수와 비감독기계번역의 규범화 흐름을 사용하는 첫 번째 작업이다. 우리는 몇 가지 비감독기계번역 기준에서 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza ujenzi wa kutengeneza mafanikio kwa ajili ya NMT isiyohifadhiwa. It leverages normalizing flows to explicitly model the distributions of sentence-level latent representations, which are subsequently used in conjunction with the attention mechanism for the translation task.  Simulizi za msingi za muundo wetu ni: (a) kuwakamata uwakilishi wa sentenca maalum kwa ajili ya kila lugha kwa kutumia mafua ya kawaida na (b) kwa kutumia mabadiliko rahisi ya uwakilishi huu wa hivi karibuni kwa kutafsiri kutoka lugha moja hadi nyingine. Ujengo huu unaruhusu mafunzo ya kila lugha isiyohifadhiwa huru. Wakati kuna kazi ya kabla ya mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya kufuatiliwa kwa MT, kwa ufahamu bora zaidi, hii ni kazi ya kwanza inayotumia mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni na kutengeneza mabadiliko ya kimataifa kwa ajili ya MT isiyo na uhakika. Tunapata matokeo ya ushindani juu ya misingi kadhaa isiyo sahihi ya MT.', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ ያልጠበቀው የNMT የፍላጻ አዲስ መሠረት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በተርጓሚው ትርጉም ማሰናከል በተጠቃሚ የሥርዓት-ደረጃ የአሁኑን መልዕክቶች ለመግለጥ በተለየ አበባዎችን በመግለጥ ያሳያል፡፡ እና (b) የአሁኑን ቋንቋ ለቋንቋ የተለየ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መልዕክቶችን ለብቻው ለመያዝ እና (b) እነዚህን የአሁኑን ቋንቋ ወደ አንዲት ቋንቋ ለመለየት ቀላል መልዕክቶችን በመጠቀም ይቀጣቸዋል፡፡ This architecture allows for unsupervised training of each language independently.  የቀድሞው ደረጃዎች ለMT የተለየ ትውቀታችን ለመሻለቅ የሚደረግ ስራ ሲሆን ይህ የመጀመሪያ ሥራ ነው፤ ይህም የቀድሞው ለውጦችን እና የተጠበቀውን የMT አበባዎች እንዲጠቀም የሚጠቅመው ነው። በብዙ የማይጠበቁ የMT benchmarks ላይ የተጠቃሚ ፍሬዎችን አግኝተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք հոսանքի հարմարեցման ճարտարապետություն անվերահսկված NMT-ի համար: Այն օգտագործում է նորմալ հոսքերը, որպեսզի բացահայտորեն մոդելավորի նախադասության մակարդակի թաքնված ներկայացումների բաշխումները, որոնք հետագայում օգտագործվում են հաղորդակցման գործի ուշադրության մեխանիզմի հետ: Մեր մոդելի հիմնական նորությունները հետևյալն են. a) լեզվին հատուկ նախադասությունների ներկայացումները առանձին վերցնելը յուրաքանչյուր լեզվի համար, օգտագործելով նորմալ հոսքերը, և b) օգտագործելով այս թաքնված ներկայացումների պարզ վերափոխությունը մեկ լեզվից մյուսը թար Այս ճարտարապետությունը թույլ է տալիս անկախ յուրաքանչյուր լեզվի անվերահսկված ուսուցման: Մինչդեռ նախորդ աշխատանք կա վերահսկված ՄԹ-ի թաքնված փոփոխականների վրա, մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից, սա առաջին աշխատանքն է, որը օգտագործում է թաքնված փոփոխականներ և նորմալիզացնում է հոսքերը անվերահսկված ՄԹ-ի համար, մենք ստանում ենք մրցակցության արդյունքներ մի քանի անվերահսկված ՄԹ', 'az': 'Bu işlərdə, NMT-dən istifadə edilməmiş bir akış adapter arhitektarını təklif edirik. Bu, cümlələr-səviyyə son göstəricilərin dağıtılmasını açıq-aşkar modellərə çevirmək üçün növbənöv qazanmaqlarını növbənöv göstərir. Sonra bu cümlələr təkrarlama işləri ilə birlikdə istifadə edilir. Bizim modelimizin ilk yenilənmələri: a) dildən bir dildən bir-birinə çevirmək üçün hər dil üçün ayrı-ayrı cümlələr təşkil etmək və b) bu son dəlillərin basit bir transformasyonu istifadə etməkdir. Bu arhitektura hər dilin təhsil edilməyən təhsil edilməsinə imkan verir. Ən yaxşı biliyimizə görə, latent dəyişikliklər MT-in üstündə daha əvvəlki işlər var, bu, latent dəyişiklikləri istifadə edən ilk işləridir və müəyyən edilməmiş MT-in dəyişiklikləri normalizəndir. Biz müqayisədə müqayisədə olmayan MT dəyişikliklərinə müvafiq sonuçları alırıq.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা একটি ফ্লুয়ার-অ্যাডাপ্টার আর্কিটার প্রস্তাব করছি অরক্ষিত এনএমটি। এটি স্বাভাবিকভাবে ফুল স্বাভাবিকভাবে বিতরণের জন্য স্পষ্টভাবে মডেল করে দেয়, যা পরে অনুবাদের কাজের জন্য মনোযোগ মাধ্যমে ব্যবহার করা হয়। The primary novelties of our model are: (a) capturing language-specific sentence representations separately for each language using normalizing flows and (b) using a simple transformation of these latent representations for translating from one language to another.  এই প্রতিটি ভাষার স্বাধীনভাবে সংরক্ষিত প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য অনুমতি দেয়। এমটির সাম্প্রতিক পরিবর্তনের উপর কাজ রয়েছে, আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোভাবে, এটা প্রথম কাজ যা সাম্প্রতিক ভেরিয়াল ব্যবহার করে এবং সংরক্ষিত এমটির জন্য স্বাভাবিক ফুল ব্যবহার করে, আমরা', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu predlažemo arhitekturu za nepotrebnu NMT-u. To utiče na normalizaciju toka da biste izrazili distribuciju poslednjih predstavljanja na razini kazne, koje se nakon toga koriste zajedno sa mehanizam pažnje za prevođenje zadataka. Glavni romani našeg model a su: a) hvatanje predstavljanja jezika određene rečenice odvojeno za svaki jezik koristeći normalizaciju toka i b) koristeći jednostavnu transformaciju ovih poslednjih predstavljanja za prevod od jednog jezika na drugi. Ova arhitektura omogućava neovisnu obuku svakog jezika nezavisno. Iako postoji prethodni rad na latentnim promjenama za nadzorne MT-e, do najboljeg znanja, to je prvi rad koji koristi latentne promjene i normalizira toke za neodržavane MT-e. Dobijamo konkurentne rezultate na nekoliko neodržavanih MT kriterija.', 'ca': "En aquest treball, proposem una arquitectura adaptadora al flux per a la MTN no supervisada. Utilitza la normalització de fluxos per modelar explícitament les distribucions de representacions latents a nivell de frases, que després s'utilitzen conjuntament amb el mecanisme d'atenció de la tasca de traducció. The primary novelties of our model are: (a) capturing language-specific sentence representations separately for each language using normalizing flows and (b) using a simple transformation of these latent representations for translating from one language to another.  Aquesta arquitectura permet formar cada llengua independentment sense supervisió. Mentre hi ha treball anterior sobre variables latents per MT supervisada, pel millor que sabem, aquesta és la primera treball que utilitza variables latents i normalitza els fluxos per MT no supervisada. Obtenim resultats competitius en diversos punts de referència de MT no supervisados.", 'cs': 'V této práci navrhujeme architekturu průtokového adaptéru pro NMT bez dozoru. Využívá normalizační toky k explicitnímu modelování distribucí latentních reprezentací na úrovni věty, které jsou následně použity ve spojení s mechanismem pozornosti pro překladovou úlohu. Primární novinkou našeho modelu jsou: (a) zachycení jazykově specifických reprezentací vět pro každý jazyk samostatně pomocí normalizačních toků a (b) použití jednoduché transformace těchto latentních reprezentací pro překlad z jednoho jazyka do druhého. Tato architektura umožňuje bez dohledu výcvik každého jazyka nezávisle. Zatímco existuje předchozí práce na latentních proměnných pro supervizované MT, podle našeho nejlepšího vědomí se jedná o první práci, která využívá latentní proměnné a normalizující toky pro supervizované MT.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja vooladapteri arhitektuuri järelevalveta NMT jaoks. See võimendab normaliseerimisvooge, et selgesõnaliselt modelleerida lausetaseme latentsete esituste jaotusi, mida hiljem kasutatakse koos tähelepanumehhanismiga tõlketöö jaoks. Meie mudeli peamised uuendused on: (a) keelespetsiifiliste lauseesituste jäädvustamine eraldi iga keele kohta normaliseerivate voogude abil ja (b) nende varjatud esinduste lihtsa teisendamise kasutamine ühest keelest teise tõlkimiseks. See arhitektuur võimaldab iga keele järelevalveta õpetada iseseisvalt. Kuigi järelevalveta MT latentsete muutujatega on eelnevalt tööd tehtud, on see meie parimate teadmiste kohaselt esimene töö, mis kasutab latentseid muutujaid ja kontrollimata MT voogude normaliseerimist. Saame konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi mitmete järelevalveta MT võrdlusnäitajate kohta.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme virtaussuodattimen arkkitehtuuria valvomattomalle NMT:lle. Se hyödyntää normalisoivia virtoja mallintaakseen lausetason piilevien esitysten jakaumia, joita käytetään myöhemmin yhdessä käännöstehtävän huomiomekanismin kanssa. Mallimme ensisijaiset uutuudet ovat: (a) kielikohtaisten lauseiden kuvaaminen erikseen kullekin kielelle normalisoivien virtojen avulla ja (b) näiden piilevien esitysten yksinkertainen muuntaminen kielestä toiseen kääntämiseen. Tämä arkkitehtuuri mahdollistaa jokaisen kielen itsenäisen kouluttamisen ilman valvontaa. Vaikka valvotun MT:n piileviä muuttujia on tutkittu aiemmin, tämä on paras tietomme mukaan ensimmäinen työ, jossa käytetään piileviä muuttujia ja normalisoidaan virtoja valvomattoman MT:n osalta. Saamme kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia useista valvomattomista MT:n vertailuarvoista.', 'tr': "Bu işde, NMT'i gözlemeýän agaç adapter arhitektegi teklip edip bilýäris. Bu syýallary soňky düzümlerniň daýlamagyny kesgitli şekilde örneklendirýär. Bu syýallary terjime görevi üçin üns mekanizmasy bilen birleşdirmek üçin ullanýar. Biziň nusgamyzyň esasy romanlary şudyr: a) dillerden bir dile terjime etmek üçin her dil üçin a ýratyn sözleri gollaýan we Bu arhitektura her dil özünden saklanmaýan eğitimäge rugsat berýär. MT denetlemeli en iyi bilgimize göre, geçtiğimiz değişkenler üzerinde önceki çalışma vardır. Bu, geçtiğimiz değişkenleri kullanan ilk çalışma ve gözlemeli MT için akışları normalleştiren ilk çalışma bölümüdür.", 'af': "In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n vloei-adapter-arkitektuur vir ononderwerp NMT. Dit verwyder die normalisering van vloede na uitduidelik model van die verspreidings van sentence-level latent verspreidings, wat volgens die aandag mekanisme vir die vertaling taak gebruik word in saam met die aandag mekanisme. Die primêre romanies van ons model is: (a) om taal-spesifieke setnings te vang skeidig vir elke taal met normalisering van vloei en (b) te gebruik 'n eenvoudige transformasie van hierdie latente voorstellings vir vertaling van een taal na 'n ander. Hierdie arkitektuur laat toe vir ononderwerp onderwerp van elke taal onveilig. Alhoewel daar voorheen werk is op latente veranderlikes vir ondersoekte MT, tot die beste van ons kennis, is dit die eerste werk wat latente veranderlikes gebruik en normaliseer vloede vir onverondersoekte MT. Ons kry konkurrentlike resultate op verskeie onverondersoekte MT-benchmarke.", 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një arkitekturë të adaptuesit të rrjedhjes për NMT të pazgjidhur. Ajo nxjerr dorë nga normalizimi i rrjedhjeve për të modeluar shprehësisht shpërndarjet e përfaqësimeve të fshehta të nivelit të dënimeve, të cilat më pas përdoren në lidhje me mekanizmin e vëmendjes për detyrën e përkthimit. Lajmet kryesore të modelit tonë janë: (a) kapja e përfaqësimeve të fjalëve specifike për gjuhën veçanërisht për çdo gjuhë duke përdorur rrjedhjet normalizuese dhe (b) përdorja e një transformimi të thjeshtë të këtyre përfaqësimeve të fshehta për përkthimin nga një gjuhë në tjetrën. Kjo arkitekturë lejon trajnimin pa mbikqyrje të çdo gjuhe në mënyrë të pavarur. Ndërsa ka punë të mëparshme mbi ndryshuesit latent për MT të mbikqyrur, sipas dijenisë sonë, kjo është punë e parë që përdor ndryshuesit latent dhe normalizon rrjedhjet për MT të pashqyrur.', 'ha': "Ga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani matsayin mai gudãna-adaptar da aka tsare wa NMT. Yana ƙara abubuwa mai normal kõguna zuwa wani dalilin rabo-daraja na latent, da ake amfani da su daban da kuma a haɗi da aikin muhalli wa aikin fassarar. Rukunan farko na misalin mu sune: (a) ka kãma masu tsari ga maganar-ƙayyade cikin harshen rarraba kowace lugha da ya yi amfani da ƙoyoyi na ɗabi'a da kuma (b) ka yi amfani da jujjarin masu motsi da waɗancan masu ƙaran zuwa wani harshe. Wannan arkin yana yarda da wa tsarin wa kõwane harshe wanda ba'a tsare ba da kansa kaɗan. Aka da wani aiki na gaba kan variabler nan nan da aka tsare MT, zuwa ga mafi kyaun ilmi, wannan shi ne na farkon aikin wanda ke amfani da variables masu ƙaranci da ke normal masu tsare MT. Tuna sami fassara a kan wasu ba'a tsare MT.", 'he': 'בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה של מתאים זרם לני-אם-טי ללא השגחה. הוא נורמליזם זרמים לנורמליזם כדי לדוגמא באופן ברור את ההפצה של מייצגים מוסתורים ברמה המשפטים, אשר משתמשים לאחר מכן ביחד עם מנגנון תשומת לב למשימת התרגום. החדשות העיקריות של המודל שלנו הן: a) לתפוס מייצגים משפטים ספציפיים לשפה בנפרד עבור כל שפה בשימוש זרמים נורמלים ו (b) בשימוש שינוי פשוט של מייצגים הלאונטים הללו לתרגם משפה אחת לשנייה. הארכיטקטורה הזו מאפשרת לאימון ללא השגחה של כל שפה באופן עצמאי. בעוד יש עבודה קודמת על משתנים מוסתורים למטה"ט ששולט, לטובת הידע שלנו, זו העבודה הראשונה שמשתמשת בשתנים מוסתורים ומנורמליזם זרמים למטה"ט שלא שולט.', 'sk': 'V tem delu predlagamo arhitekturo pretočnih adapterjev za nenadzorovane NMT. Izkorišča normalizacijske tokove za eksplicitno modeliranje porazdelitev latentnih predstavitev na ravni stavka, ki se kasneje uporabljajo v povezavi z mehanizmom pozornosti za prevajalsko nalogo. Primarne novosti našega modela so: (a) ločeno zajemanje jezikovno specifičnih stavkovnih predstavitev za vsak jezik z uporabo normalizacijskih tokov in (b) preprosta transformacija teh latentnih predstavitev za prevajanje iz enega jezika v drugega. Ta arhitektura omogoča neodvisno izobraževanje vsakega jezika brez nadzora. Čeprav obstaja predhodno delo na latentnih spremenljivkah za nadzorovano MT, je to po našem najboljšem znanju prvo delo, ki uporablja latentne spremenljivke in normalizacijo tokov za nadzorovano MT. Pridobimo konkurenčne rezultate na več neizorovanih MT referenčnih vrednostih.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo akeh-adaturan kanggo NMT gak torah nggawe. Jejaring Nari mbubuturan sing dumatenne ning model kita iku: (a) nggawe kelangan langkung kelangan langkung weruh gak bener kanggo saben langa architecture iki supoyo kanggo tukang mrogram sing gak bakal terusan ning luwih sedhaya. MT', 'bo': 'ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་NMT ལ་ཕབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་འགྱུར་བ་གྱི་བཟོ་སྐྲུན་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། འདིས་ཕལ་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་འདུག་ངེས་པར་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་བགོ་སྤྲོད་གནང་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱད་ལས། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་རྩ་བའི་མཐོ་གཏོང་ཚིག་དག: (a) སྐད་རིགས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་ཚིག སྒྲིག་འགོད་འདིས་སྐད་རེ་རེར་སོ་སོ་སྐབས་བསྡུར་མི་གློག་འཛུགས་གནང་བྱེད་ཆོག MT ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞན་པའི་མགོ་མ་ཡོད་པ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགའ་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། འདི་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཆེད་སྔོན་པ་གིས་མཇུག་བསྡུར་མ་བྱེད་པའི་འགྱུར་འགྱུར་མཁན་ཚུ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ལས'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'ضغط الجمل الفعال غير الخاضع للإشراف عن طريق الضبط الدقيق للمحولات باستخدام التعلم المعزز', 'fr': 'Compression de phrase non supervisée efficace par réglage fin des transformateurs avec apprentissage par renforcement', 'pt': 'Compressão de sentença não supervisionada eficiente por transformadores de ajuste fino com aprendizado por reforço', 'es': 'Compresión eficiente de oraciones sin supervisión mediante el ajuste fino de los transformadores con aprendizaje por refuerzo', 'ja': '強化学習付きトランスフォーマーを微調整することによる効率的な監督なしの文章圧縮', 'hi': 'सुदृढीकरण सीखने के साथ ठीक ट्यूनिंग ट्रांसफॉर्मर द्वारा कुशल असुरक्षित वाक्य संपीड़न', 'zh': '以强学微变压器高效无监句压缩', 'ru': 'Эффективное неконтролируемое сжатие предложений с помощью тонкой настройки трансформаторов с обучением арматуре', 'ga': 'Comhbhrú Pianbhreithe Éifeachtach Gan Maoirseacht ag Trasfhoirmeoirí a Mhionchoigeartú le Foghlaim Neartaithe', 'el': 'Αποτελεσματική μη επιτηρούμενη συμπίεση προτάσεων με τη βελτίωση των μετασχηματιστών με τη μάθηση ενίσχυσης', 'hu': 'Hatékony felügyelet nélküli mondattömörítés a transzformátorok finomhangolásával a megerősítési tanulással', 'ka': 'ეფექტიური არსებული სიტყვების კომპრესია საკუთარი კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებელი ტრანფიგურაციის გამოყენებელი', 'it': "Compressione delle frasi non sorvegliata efficiente mediante la messa a punto dei trasformatori con l'apprendimento del rinforzo", 'lt': 'Veiksmingas nenorėtas bausmės spaudimas, kurį atlieka patobulinantys transformatoriai ir stiprinantis mokymasis', 'mk': 'Ефикасна ненадгледувана судска компресија од страна на финетизирачките трансформери со зајакнувачко учење', 'kk': 'Құрастыру оқыту арқылы таңдау түрлендірушілердің әсер етілмеген сөз компрессиясы', 'ms': 'Pemampatan Hukum Tidak Dijaga Efisien Oleh Penukar Penyesuai Terbaik dengan Belajar Pengesahan', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനൊപ്പം നല്ല ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ശിക്ഷ പരിശോധിക്കാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ', 'mt': 'Kompressjoni Effiċjenti tas-Sentenza Mhux Sorveljata minn Trasformaturi ta’ Aġġustament Irfinat b’Tagħlim ta’ Rinforzament', 'mn': 'Дасгалжуулах суралцагчдын сайн түвшилтэй түвшилтэй хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн өгүүлбөр', 'no': 'Effektivt ikkje-oppretta teiknkompresjon av finnstillingstransformatorar med forstørringar', 'pl': 'Wydajna nienadzorowana kompresja zdań dzięki dostosowaniu transformatorów z uczeniem się wzmocnień', 'ro': 'Comprimarea eficientă a propoziţiilor nesupravegheată prin reglarea fină a transformatoarelor cu învăţarea întăririi', 'sr': 'Efektivno nepotrebno kompresije kazne od strane transformatora fino podešavanje sa učenjem pojačanja', 'so': 'Effective Unwatched Sentence Compression by Fine-tuning Transformers with Reinforcement Learning', 'sv': 'Effektiv oövervakad meningskompression genom finjustering av transformatorer med förstärkningsinlärning', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණ වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'ta': 'வாக்குறுக்குரிய அமர்வு கட்டுப்பாடு', 'ur': 'پاکیزہ تغییر تغییر کرنے والوں کے ذریعے پاکیزہ غیر پاکیزہ سنت کی کمپرس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hiệu quả Nén bản án chưa được giám sát qua các biến hình...', 'bg': 'Ефективно неконтролирано компресиране на изреченията чрез фина настройка на трансформаторите с обучение за подсилване', 'da': 'Effektiv uovervåget sætningskompression ved finjustering af transformatorer med forstærkelseslæring', 'nl': 'Efficiënte niet-gecontroleerde zinscompressie door transformatoren te verfijnen met versterking leren', 'de': 'Effiziente, unbeaufsichtigte Satzkomprimierung durch Feinabstimmung von Transformatoren mit Reinforcement Learning', 'hr': 'Učinjena nepotrebna kompresija kazne od strane transformatora finog prilagođavanja s učenjem pojačanja', 'ko': '학습 강화를 바탕으로 하는 마이크로 변압기의 효율적인 무감독 문장 압축', 'fa': 'تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای با یادگیری\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200c', 'sw': 'Makizo yasiyo na ufanisi yanayofuatiliwa na Watafsiri wenye mafunzo ya Mabadiliko', 'tr': 'Güçlemek öwrenmeli Faýllar tarapyndan gaýd edilmedik sözler Sykmak', 'af': 'Effektiewe Onondersteunde Sagtel Kompresie deur Fine- tuning Transformeerders met Versterking Leer', 'sq': 'Efficient Unsupervised Sentence Compression by Fine-tuning Transformers with Reinforcement Learning', 'am': 'በኩል ያልጠበቀው ስርዓት Compression by Fine-tuning Transformers with Reinforcement Learn', 'hy': 'Ավելի արդյունավետ անվերահսկված նախադասությունների կոմպրեսը բարձրացնող վերափոխողների կողմից ուժեղացված ուսումնասիրությամբ', 'az': 'G칲칞l톛m톛 칐yr톛nm톛si il톛 캻yi T톛rcl톛yici T톛rcl톛yici', 'bn': 'কার্যকর শিক্ষা পুনরায় শিক্ষা দিয়ে ভালো ট্রান্সফর্মারের দ্বারা শাস্তি প্রত্যাখ্যান করা হয়েছে', 'id': 'Efisien Kompresi Hukuman Belum Disupervisi oleh Transformer Penyesuaian Terbaik dengan Pelajaran Penyukuran', 'ca': "Compresió eficient de sentences sense supervisió pels transformadors d'ajustes fins amb aprenentatge de reforç", 'cs': 'Efektivní nekontrolovaná komprese vět pomocí jemného ladění transformátorů s učením posílení', 'et': 'Tõhus järelevalveta lause tihendamine Transformerite täpse häälestamise abil tugevdusõppega', 'fi': 'Tehokas kontrolloimaton lauseiden puristus hienosäätimellä muuntajia vahvistamalla oppimista', 'bs': 'Efektivno nepotrebno kompresije kazne od strane transformatora za fino podešavanje sa učenjem pojačanja', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'דיכוי משפט יעיל ללא שליטה על ידי מעצבים מתאימים עם לימוד תגבורה', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Učinkovito stiskanje stavkov brez nadzora z natančnim nastavitvijo transformatorjev z učenjem okrepitve', 'bo': 'Efficient Unsupervised Sentence Compression by Fine-tuning Transformers with Reinforcement Learning'}
{'en': 'Motivated by the success of T5 (Text-To-Text Transfer Transformer) in pre-trained natural language processing models, we propose a unified-modal SpeechT5 framework that explores the encoder-decoder pre-training for self-supervised speech/text representation learning. The SpeechT5 framework consists of a shared encoder-decoder network and six modal-specific (speech/text) pre/post-nets. After preprocessing the input speech/text through the pre-nets, the shared encoder-decoder network models the sequence-to-sequence transformation, and then the post-nets generate the output in the speech/text modality based on the output of the decoder. Leveraging large-scale unlabeled speech and text data, we pre-train SpeechT5 to learn a unified-modal representation, hoping to improve the modeling capability for both speech and text. To align the textual and speech information into this unified semantic space, we propose a cross-modal vector quantization approach that randomly mixes up speech/text states with latent units as the interface between encoder and decoder. Extensive evaluations show the superiority of the proposed SpeechT5 framework on a wide variety of spoken language processing tasks, including automatic speech recognition, speech synthesis, speech translation, voice conversion, speech enhancement, and speaker identification.', 'ar': 'يقلل ضغط الجمل من طول النص عن طريق إزالة المحتوى غير الأساسي مع الحفاظ على الحقائق الهامة والقواعد النحوية. يمكن استخدام الأساليب غير الخاضعة للإشراف الموجهة لضغط الجملة لإنشاء نماذج مخصصة دون الحاجة إلى بيانات تدريب على الحقيقة الأساسية ، مع السماح بالمرونة في الوظيفة (الوظائف) الموضوعية المستخدمة للتعلم والاستدلال. تستخدم مناهج ضغط الجملة الحديثة غير الخاضعة للإشراف أهدافًا مخصصة لتوجيه البحث المنفصل ؛ ومع ذلك ، فإن البحث الموجه مكلف في وقت الاستدلال. في هذا العمل ، نستكشف استخدام التعلم المعزز لتدريب نماذج ضغط الجمل الفعالة والتي تكون سريعة أيضًا عند إنشاء التنبؤات. على وجه الخصوص ، قمنا بوضع المهمة على أنها تسمية تسلسل ثنائي وقمنا بضبط محول مُدرَّب مسبقًا باستخدام نهج بسيط لتدرج السياسة. يتفوق نهجنا على النماذج الأخرى غير الخاضعة للإشراف بينما يكون أيضًا أكثر كفاءة في وقت الاستدلال.', 'pt': 'A compactação de frases reduz o comprimento do texto removendo conteúdo não essencial, preservando fatos importantes e gramaticalidade. Métodos orientados a objetivos não supervisionados para compactação de sentenças podem ser usados para criar modelos personalizados sem a necessidade de dados de treinamento de verdade, permitindo flexibilidade na(s) função(ões) objetivo(s) usada(s) para aprendizado e inferência. As abordagens recentes de compactação de frases não supervisionadas usam objetivos personalizados para orientar a pesquisa discreta; no entanto, a pesquisa guiada é cara no momento da inferência. Neste trabalho, exploramos o uso do aprendizado por reforço para treinar modelos de compressão de sentença eficazes que também são rápidos na geração de previsões. Em particular, lançamos a tarefa como rotulagem de sequência binária e ajustamos um transformador pré-treinado usando uma abordagem simples de gradiente de política. Nossa abordagem supera outros modelos não supervisionados, além de ser mais eficiente no momento da inferência.', 'fr': "La compression de phrase réduit la longueur du texte en supprimant le contenu non essentiel tout en préservant les faits importants et la grammaticalité. Les méthodes non supervisées axées sur les objectifs pour la compression de phrases peuvent être utilisées pour créer des modèles personnalisés sans avoir besoin de données d'entraînement fondées sur la vérité de terrain, tout en offrant une flexibilité dans la ou les fonctions objectives utilisées pour l'apprentissage et l'inférence. Les approches récentes de compression de phrase non supervisée utilisent des objectifs personnalisés pour guider la recherche discrète\xa0; cependant, la recherche guidée est coûteuse au moment de l'inférence. Dans ce travail, nous explorons l'utilisation de l'apprentissage par renforcement pour entraîner des modèles de compression de phrases efficaces qui sont également rapides lors de la génération de prédictions. En particulier, nous avons défini la tâche comme un étiquetage de séquence binaire et nous affinons un transformateur pré-entraîné à l'aide d'une approche de gradient de politique simple. Notre approche surpasse les autres modèles non supervisés tout en étant plus efficace au moment de l'inférence.", 'es': 'La compresión de oraciones reduce la longitud del texto al eliminar el contenido no esencial y, al mismo tiempo, preservar los datos importantes y la gramaticalidad. Los métodos no supervisados basados en objetivos para la compresión de oraciones se pueden utilizar para crear modelos personalizados sin la necesidad de datos de entrenamiento de verdad fundamental, al tiempo que permiten flexibilidad en las funciones objetivas que se utilizan para el aprendizaje y la inferencia. Los enfoques recientes de compresión de oraciones sin supervisión utilizan objetivos personalizados para guiar la búsqueda discreta; sin embargo, la búsqueda guiada es costosa en el momento de la inferencia. En este trabajo, exploramos el uso del aprendizaje por refuerzo para entrenar modelos efectivos de compresión de oraciones que también son rápidos a la hora de generar predicciones. En particular, diseñamos la tarea como etiquetado de secuencias binarias y ajustamos un transformador previamente entrenado utilizando un enfoque de gradiente de políticas simple. Nuestro enfoque supera a otros modelos no supervisados y, al mismo tiempo, es más eficiente en el momento de la inferencia.', 'ja': '文圧縮は、重要な事実と文法性を維持しながら、非必須コンテンツを削除することによってテキストの長さを短縮します。文圧縮のための教師なしの客観的駆動方法は、学習および推論に使用される客観的関数（複数可）の柔軟性を可能にしながら、地上真実訓練データを必要とせずにカスタマイズされたモデルを作成するために使用することができる。最近の非監視文圧縮アプローチは、離散検索を誘導するためにカスタム目標を使用します。しかし、推論時間では誘導検索は高価です。この研究では、予測を生成する際にも高速な効果的な文圧縮モデルをトレーニングするための強化学習の使用を探求します。特に、バイナリシーケンスラベルとしてタスクをキャストし、単純なポリシー勾配アプローチを使用して事前にトレーニングされた変圧器を微調整します。私たちのアプローチは、推論時間でより効率的でありながら、他の監督されていないモデルよりも優れています。', 'zh': '句压缩删非必要以损本长,兼存要语法。 句压缩无监督之法,可以创自定义模形,而无地实练数,兼许以学理函数灵活性。 近无监句压缩法用自定义以导离散搜索。 但在推理时,引式搜索的成本很高。 求其强学以训句压缩,其成测亦速矣。 特以转事为二进制序标记,并用简策梯度法对预练变压器微调。 吾道优于无监模,同时推理亦有效率。', 'hi': 'वाक्य संपीड़न महत्वपूर्ण तथ्यों और व्याकरणिकता को संरक्षित करते हुए गैर-आवश्यक सामग्री को हटाकर पाठ की लंबाई को कम करता है। वाक्य संपीड़न के लिए असुरक्षित उद्देश्य संचालित विधियों का उपयोग ग्राउंड-ट्रुथ प्रशिक्षण डेटा की आवश्यकता के बिना अनुकूलित मॉडल बनाने के लिए किया जा सकता है, जबकि सीखने और अनुमान के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले उद्देश्य फ़ंक्शन (ओं) में लचीलेपन की अनुमति देता है। हाल ही में असुरक्षित वाक्य संपीड़न दृष्टिकोण असतत खोज का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए कस्टम उद्देश्यों का उपयोग करते हैं; हालांकि, निर्देशित खोज अनुमान समय पर महंगी है। इस काम में, हम प्रभावी वाक्य संपीड़न मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखने के उपयोग का पता लगाते हैं जो भविष्यवाणियां उत्पन्न करते समय भी तेज होते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम बाइनरी अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के रूप में कार्य डालते हैं और एक सरल नीति ढाल दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित ट्रांसफार्मर को ठीक करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण अन्य असुरक्षित मॉडलों को मात देता है, जबकि अनुमान समय पर अधिक कुशल भी होता है।', 'ru': 'Сжатие предложения уменьшает длину текста, удаляя несущественное содержание при сохранении важных фактов и грамматичности. Неконтролируемые целевые методы сжатия предложений могут быть использованы для создания индивидуализированных моделей без необходимости в обучающих данных о наземной истине, обеспечивая при этом гибкость целевой функции(функций), которые используются для обучения и вывода. Недавние неконтролируемые подходы к сжатию предложений используют пользовательские цели для управления дискретным поиском; однако, управляемый поиск является дорогостоящим во время вывода. В этой работе мы исследуем использование обучения подкреплению для обучения эффективным моделям сжатия предложений, которые также являются быстрыми при генерации прогнозов. В частности, мы поставили задачу в виде маркировки двоичной последовательности и тонкой настройки предварительно обученного трансформатора с использованием простого подхода градиента политики. Наш подход превосходит другие неконтролируемые модели, а также является более эффективным во время вывода.', 'ga': 'Laghdaíonn comhbhrú abairtí fad an téacs trí ábhar neamhriachtanach a bhaint agus ag caomhnú fíricí tábhachtacha agus gramadaí. Is féidir modhanna neamh-stiúrtha oibiachtúla do chomhbhrú abairtí a úsáid chun samhlacha saincheaptha a chruthú gan gá le sonraí oiliúna atá bunaithe ar an talamh, agus ag an am céanna solúbthacht a cheadú sna feidhmeanna oibiachtúla a úsáidtear le haghaidh foghlama agus tátail. Úsáideann cur chuige comhbhrú abairtí gan mhaoirseacht le déanaí cuspóirí saincheaptha chun cuardach scoite a threorú; áfach, tá cuardach treoraithe costasach ag am tátail. San obair seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar úsáid na foghlama atreisithe chun samhlacha éifeachtacha comhbhrú abairtí a oiliúint atá tapa freisin agus tuartha á nginiúint. Go háirithe, thugamar faoin tasc mar lipéadú seichimh dhénártha agus déanaimid mionchoigeartú ar chlaochladán réamhoilte ag baint úsáide as cur chuige grádán beartais simplí. Is fearr lenár gcur chuige ná múnlaí eile gan mhaoirseacht agus ag an am céanna a bheith níos éifeachtaí ag am tátail.', 'el': 'Η συμπίεση φράσεων μειώνει το μήκος του κειμένου αφαιρώντας μη ουσιώδες περιεχόμενο διατηρώντας παράλληλα σημαντικά γεγονότα και γραμματικότητα. Οι μη εποπτευόμενες αντικειμενικές μέθοδοι συμπίεσης προτάσεων μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για τη δημιουργία προσαρμοσμένων μοντέλων χωρίς την ανάγκη για δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης με βάση την αλήθεια, επιτρέποντας παράλληλα ευελιξία στις αντικειμενικές λειτουργίες που χρησιμοποιούνται για τη μάθηση και την εξαγωγή συμπερασμάτων. Πρόσφατες προσεγγίσεις συμπίεσης προτάσεων χωρίς επίβλεψη χρησιμοποιούν προσαρμοσμένους στόχους για να καθοδηγήσουν τη διακριτή αναζήτηση. Ωστόσο, η καθοδηγούμενη αναζήτηση είναι δαπανηρή κατά το χρόνο συμπερασμάτων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε τη χρήση της μάθησης ενίσχυσης για την εκπαίδευση αποτελεσματικών μοντέλων συμπίεσης προτάσεων που είναι επίσης γρήγορες κατά τη δημιουργία προβλέψεων. Ειδικότερα, θέτουμε το έργο ως σήμανση δυαδικής ακολουθίας και τελειοποιούμε έναν προ-εκπαιδευμένο μετασχηματιστή χρησιμοποιώντας μια απλή προσέγγιση διαβάθμισης πολιτικής. Η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά τα άλλα μοντέλα χωρίς επίβλεψη ενώ είναι επίσης πιο αποτελεσματική στο χρόνο συμπερασμάτων.', 'hu': 'A mondattömörítés csökkenti a szöveg hosszát azáltal, hogy eltávolítja a nem lényeges tartalmat, miközben megőrzi a fontos tényeket és nyelvtanitást. A felügyelet nélküli objektív vezérelt mondattömörítési módszerek használhatók testreszabott modellek létrehozására, anélkül, hogy alapvető igazságszolgáltatási adatokra lenne szükség, miközben rugalmasságot tesznek lehetővé a tanuláshoz és következtetéshez használt objektív funkció(ok)ban. A közelmúltban felügyelet nélküli mondattömörítési megközelítések egyedi célokat használnak a diszkrét keresés irányítására; Azonban az irányított keresés drága a következtetések időpontjában. Ebben a munkában megvizsgáljuk a megerősítési tanulás használatát a hatékony mondattömörítő modellek képzésére, amelyek szintén gyorsak a jóslatok generálásában. Különösen a feladatot bináris szekvencia címkézésként vetjük, és finomhangoljuk egy előre képzett transzformátort egy egyszerű szakpolitikai gradiens megközelítéssel. Megközelítésünk felülmúlja a többi felügyelet nélküli modellt, miközben hatékonyabb a következtetések időpontjában is.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების კომპრესი ტექსტის სიგრძე შემცირებს, რომელიც არ არის მნიშვნელოვანი შემდგომარების წაშლად მნიშვნელოვანი ფაქტები და გრამიმატიკალობის შე შეიძლება გამოყენება კომპრექციისთვის განსხვავებული მოდელების შექმნა, რომლებიც საკუთარი მოდელების განსხვავებას და ინფრექციისთვის გამოყენება არ უნდა გავაკეთოთ საკუთარი მოდელების განსხვავებას, რომ მიმდინარე არ განსხვავებული სიტყვების კომპრექციის მიღება განსხვავებული მიზეზების გამოყენება დისკრეტული ძიება; მაგრამ, მოწყვეტილი ძიება ინფრენციის დროში ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვაკვირდებით სწავლების გამოყენება, რომელიც ეფექტიური კომპრესიის მოდელების შემწავლობა, რომლებიც სწრაფად წარმოდგენების შექმნა. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ დავაწერეთ საქაღალდეს როგორც ბინარი სერვინციის მარტილია და დავაწერეთ პროლიტიკური გრადიენტის გამოყენებით პროლიტიკური გარეშე. ჩვენი პროგორმა უფრო მუშაობს სხვა არაფერიზებული მოდელები, როგორც უფრო ეფექტიურია ინფერიციის დროში.', 'it': "La compressione delle frasi riduce la lunghezza del testo rimuovendo contenuti non essenziali preservando fatti importanti e grammaticalità. I metodi oggettivi non controllati per la compressione delle frasi possono essere utilizzati per creare modelli personalizzati senza la necessità di dati di formazione sulla verità di base, consentendo al contempo flessibilità nelle funzioni oggettive utilizzate per l'apprendimento e l'inferenza. Recenti approcci di compressione delle frasi non supervisionati utilizzano obiettivi personalizzati per guidare la ricerca discreta; Tuttavia, la ricerca guidata è costosa al momento dell'inferenza. In questo lavoro, esploriamo l'uso dell'apprendimento di rinforzo per formare modelli efficaci di compressione delle frasi che sono anche veloci quando generano previsioni. In particolare, lanciamo il compito come etichettatura di sequenza binaria e perfezioniamo un trasformatore pre-addestrato utilizzando un semplice approccio di gradiente politico. Il nostro approccio supera altri modelli non supervisionati, pur essendo più efficiente al momento dell'inferenza.", 'lt': 'Nuorodų spaudimas sumažina teksto trukmę pašalinant neesminį turinį ir išsaugodamas svarbius faktus ir gramatiškumą. Neprižiūrimi objektyvūs frazių spaudimo metodai gali būti naudojami sukurti pritaikytus modelius, nereikalaujant duomenų apie mokymą iš esmės, kartu suteikiant galimybę lanksčiai atlikti objektyvią (-as) funkciją (-as), naudojamą (-as) mokymuisi ir išvadoms. Neseniai nepastebimi sakinių suspaudimo metodai naudoja savarankiškus tikslus atskirai paieškai vadovauti; tačiau vadovaujama paieška yra brangi išvados metu. Šiame darbe mes tiriame galimybę pasinaudoti mokymosi stiprinimu, kad būtų mokomi veiksmingi sakinių spaudimo modeliai, kurie taip pat greitai sukuria prognozes. Visų pirma mes atliekame užduotį kaip dviejų sekų ženklinimas ir iš anksto apmokytas transformatorius, taikant paprastą politikos gradient ą. Mūsų požiūris yra didesnis už kitus nepastebimus modelius ir tuo pačiu metu yra veiksmingesnis.', 'mk': 'Компресијата на речениците ја намалува должината на текстот со отстранување на неосновната содржина, при што се зачуваат важни факти и граматичност. Ненадгледувани објективни методи за компресија на речениците може да се користат за создавање на прилагодени модели без потреба од податоци за обука на основната вистина, истовремено овозможувајќи флексибилност во објективната функција(и) која(и) се користи(и) за Неодамнешните ненадгледувани пристапи на компресија на реченици користат сопствени цели за водење на дискретно пребарување; сепак, управуваното пребарување е скапо во времето на конференција. Во оваа работа, ја истражуваме употребата на зајакнување на учењето за обука на ефикасни модели за компресија на речениците кои исто така се брзи кога генерираат предвидувања. Особено, ја ставаме задачата како бинарно означување на секвенца и подобруваме предобучен трансформатор со едноставен пристап до политиката. Нашиот пристап е поголем од другите ненадгледувани модели, истовремено и поефикасен во времето на конференција.', 'kk': 'Сөзді сығу мәтіннің ұзындығын негізгі мазмұнын өшіру үшін маңызды факттерді және грамматикалықты сақтау үшін қысқартады. Сөздерді компрессиялау үшін қолданылмаған мақсатты көмектесілмеген әдістер, жергілікті оқыту және бағыттау үшін қолданылатын мақсатты мәліметтерді құру үшін қолданылады. Жуырдағы мәліметті сәйкестірмеген сәйкестіру керектері дискретті іздеу үшін өзгертілген мақсаттарды қолданып, қолданылады. Бірақ бағытталған іздеу кезінде бағатты. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз оқыту үшін көмектесу үшін әсер ететін сөздерді көмектесу үлгілерін зерттейміз. Сонымен қатар, бұл сөздерді көмектесу үлгілерін құр Әрине біз тапсырманы бинарлық реттеу жарлығы ретінде және алдыңғы оқылған түрлендірушісін қарапайым саясаттық градиенттің көмегімен түрлендіріп жібердік. Біздің тәсіліміміз басқа бағытталмаған үлгілерді жұмыс істейді, сондай-ақ басқа бағытталмаған үлгілерді жұмыс істейді.', 'ms': 'Pemampatan perkataan mengurangkan panjang teks dengan membuang kandungan tidak penting sambil menyimpan fakta penting dan grammatikal. Unsupervised objective driven methods for sentence compression can be used to create customized models without the need for ground-truth training data, while allowing flexibility in the objective function(s) that are used for learning and inference.  pendekatan pemampatan kalimat tidak diawasi baru-baru ini menggunakan sasaran suai untuk memimpin gelintar diskret; bagaimanapun, carian panduan mahal pada masa kesimpulan. Dalam kerja ini, kami mengeksplorasi penggunaan pembelajaran kuasa untuk melatih model pemampatan kalimat yang efektif yang juga cepat bila menghasilkan ramalan. Secara khususnya, kami melemparkan tugas sebagai label urutan binari dan menyesuaikan penyesuaian pra-dilatih menggunakan pendekatan gradien kebijakan sederhana. Pendekatan kita melebihi model lain yang tidak diawasi sementara juga lebih efisien pada masa kesimpulan.', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കളും ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്റ്റിക്റ്റിക്റ്റിയും സൂക്ഷിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ നീളം വാക്കു വാക്ക് പൊരുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സാധനങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല അടുത്തുതന്നെ സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത വാക്കിന്റെ ചുരുക്കുന്ന അടുത്തുവരുന്നു എന്നാലും നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലുള്ള തെരച്ചില്\u200d അപകടത്തില്\u200d വിലയുണ്ട്. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വേഗത്തിലുള്ള വാക്ക് സമ്പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ശേഷിക് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ജോലിയെ ബൈനറി സെക്കന്റ് ലേബിളിങ്ങ് എന്നിട്ട് നല്ല പരിശീലന മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു സാധാരണ പോല Our approach outperforms other unsupervised models while also being more efficient at inference time.', 'mt': 'Il-kompressjoni tas-sentenza tnaqqas it-tul tat-test billi tneħħi kontenut mhux essenzjali filwaqt li tippreserva fatti u grammatika importanti. Metodi oġġettivi mhux sorveljati xprunati għall-kompressjoni tas-sentenza jistgħu jintużaw biex jinħolqu mudelli personalizzati mingħajr il-ħtieġa għal dejta ta’ taħriġ tal-verità tal-art, filwaqt li jippermettu flessibbiltà fil-funzjoni(jiet) oġġettiva(i) li jintużaw għat-tagħlim u l-inferenza. Approċċi reċenti ta’ kompressjoni tas-sentenzi mhux sorveljati jużaw għanijiet personali biex jiggwidaw tiftix diskret; madankollu, it-tiftix iggwidat jiswa ħafna fiż-żmien tal-inferenza. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna nesploraw l-użu tat-tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar biex inħarrġu mudelli effettivi ta’ kompressjoni tas-sentenzi li huma wkoll mgħaġġla meta niġġeneraw tbassir. B’mod partikolari, a ħna nieħdu l-kompitu bħala tikkettar binarju tas-sekwenza u nidfinaw trasformatur imħarreġ minn qabel bl-użu ta’ approċċ sempliċi ta’ gradjent tal-politika. Our approach outperforms other unsupervised models while also being more efficient at inference time.', 'pl': 'Kompresja zdań zmniejsza długość tekstu poprzez usuwanie nieistotnych treści przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu ważnych faktów i gramatyczności. Nie nadzorowane obiektywne metody kompresji zdań mogą być wykorzystywane do tworzenia dostosowanych modeli bez potrzeby podstawowych danych treningowych, jednocześnie umożliwiając elastyczność funkcji obiektywnych wykorzystywanych do uczenia się i wnioskowania. Ostatnie metody kompresji zdań bez nadzoru wykorzystują niestandardowe cele do prowadzenia dyskretnego wyszukiwania; Jednak wyszukiwanie kierowane jest kosztowne w czasie wnioskowania. W niniejszej pracy badamy wykorzystanie uczenia się wzmacniającego do trenowania efektywnych modeli kompresji zdań, które są również szybkie podczas generowania prognoz. W szczególności postrzegamy zadanie jako etykietowanie sekwencji binarnych i dostosowujemy wstępnie przeszkolony transformator przy użyciu prostego podejścia gradientowego polityki. Nasze podejście przewyższa inne modele bez nadzoru, a jednocześnie jest bardziej efektywne w czasie wnioskowania.', 'mn': 'Үүний даралтын хэмжээсүүд нь чухал үнэндээ болон грамматик байдлыг хадгалах үед чухал биш байдлыг устгаж текст уртыг багасгаж байна. Шилтгэлийн даралтын төлөөлөгдсөн зорилготгүй зорилготой арга баримтуудыг суралцах, халдвар авах зорилготой функц(үүд) дээр дасгал хөгжүүлэх шаардлагагүй загваруудыг бүтээхэд ашиглаж болно. Саяхан шалгалтгүй өгүүлбэл хайлтын тулд хувийн зорилго ашигладаг. Гэхдээ удирдлагатай хайх нь халдварын цаг хугацаанд үнэтэй. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид таамаглал гаргах үед маш хурдан шингээх сургалтын хэрэглээ судалж байна. Ялангуяа бид үүнийг хоёр дахь дарааллын загварын загвар бичиж, урд сургалтын шилжүүлэгчийг хялбар бодлогын градиентын аргыг ашиглан тодорхойлох болно. Бидний арга хэмжээнд халдварлах цаг хугацаанд илүү үр дүнтэй байдаг.', 'ro': 'Comprimarea propozițiilor reduce lungimea textului prin eliminarea conținutului neesențial, păstrând în același timp fapte importante și gramaticalitate. Metodele nesupravegheate orientate spre obiectiv pentru compresia propozițiilor pot fi utilizate pentru a crea modele personalizate fără a fi nevoie de date de instruire a adevărului de bază, permițând în același timp flexibilitatea funcției obiective utilizate pentru învățare și inferență. Abordările recente de compresie a frazelor nesupravegheate folosesc obiective personalizate pentru a ghida căutarea discretă; Cu toate acestea, căutarea ghidată este scumpă la momentul inferenței. În această lucrare, explorăm utilizarea învățării de armare pentru a instrui modele eficiente de compresie a frazelor, care sunt, de asemenea, rapide atunci când generează predicții. În special, vom folosi sarcina ca etichetare binară a secvențelor și vom regla fin un transformator pre-instruit folosind o abordare simplă a gradului de politică. Abordarea noastră depășește alte modele nesupravegheate, fiind, de asemenea, mai eficientă în momentul inferenței.', 'no': 'Komprimering av teikn reduserer lengden på teksten ved å fjerna ikkje-nødvendig innhald medan det lagrar viktige faktar og grammatikk. Du kan bruka målsettingsmetodar for å komprimera setningar utan målsettingsopplæring av bakgrunnsannene utan målsettingsopplæring av data, mens det tillater fleksibilitet i målsettingsfunksjonane(ane) som vert bruka for læring og infeksjon. Nyleg ikkje oppretta setningskomprimeringstilnærmingar brukar sjølvvalde mål for å hjelpa diskrete søk. Men hjelpetekst søk er dykka ved infeksjonstid. I denne arbeiden utforskar vi bruken av stipringslæring for å trene effektiv setningsmodular som også er rask når det genererar foregåver. I særskilt kastar vi oppgåva som merkelapp for binærsekvens og finn opp ei fortrengt transformer med ein enkel fargeovergangspunkt for politikk. Tilnærminga vårt utfører andre ikkje-oppretta modeller mens også er meir effektiv ved infeksjonstid.', 'sr': 'Kompresija kazne smanjuje dužinu teksta uklanjanjem neophodnog sadržaja dok čuva važne činjenice i gramatičnost. Neodređene objektivne metode za kompresiju rečenica mogu se koristiti za stvaranje prilagođenih modela bez potrebe za podacima obuke zemaljske istine, dok omogućava fleksibilnost objektivnih funkcija(s) koje se koriste za učenje i infekciju. Nedavno neodređeni pristupi kompresiji rečenica koriste posebne ciljeve za voditi diskretnu potragu; međutim, vodjena potraga je skupa u vrijeme infekcije. U ovom poslu istražujemo korištenje učenja pojačanja kako bi obučili efikasne modele kompresije rečenica koje su takođe brze u stvaranju predviđanja. Posebno, bacili smo zadatak kao etiketiranje binarne sekvence i ispravljali predobučenog transformatora koristeći jednostavan pristup političkim gradientima. Naš pristup iznosi druge nepotrebne modele, a takođe je efikasniji u vrijeme infekcije.', 'so': "Xarunta dhibaatadu wuxuu hoosaysiiyaa dhererka qoraalka, marka uu soo qaado waxyaabaha aan muhiim ahayn marka la ilaaliyo arrimaha muhiimka ah iyo maareynta. Isku isticmaali karo qaababka la ilaaliyo oo aan la ilaalinayn, in loo sameeyo tusaale caadi ah oo aan u baahnayn waxbarashada runta ah, iyadoo loo ogolaan karo caqliga awoodda waxqabadka la'aanta ah ee loo isticmaalayo barashada iyo dhibaatada. Meelaha caadooyinka ee la soo dhowaaday ee aan la ilaalinayn qeyb-dhigidda lagu isticmaalo si uu u hago baaritaanka kala duwan; Si kastaba ha ahaatee raadinta la hagayo waa qaali waqtiga jirada. Markaas waxan waxaynu ku baaraannaa isticmaalka kordhiska barashada si aan u tababarinno modelalka hoos-dhigista shaqada ah, kuwaas oo sidoo kale dhaqdhaqaaqsan marka la sameeyo wax sii sheego. Si gaar ah, waxaynu shaqada u bandhignaynaa qalabka labaad oo labo ah iyo si fiican loona beddelayo qaab fudud oo siyaasadeed ah. Our approach outperforms other unsupervised models while also being more efficient at inference time.", 'sv': 'Fraskomprimering minskar textlängden genom att ta bort icke-väsentligt innehåll samtidigt som viktiga fakta och grammatik bevaras. Icke övervakade objektiva metoder för meningskompression kan användas för att skapa anpassade modeller utan behov av grundsanningsträningsdata, samtidigt som det möjliggör flexibilitet i de objektiva funktioner som används för lärande och inferens. Nyligen oövervakade meningskompressionsmetoder använder anpassade mål för att styra diskret sökning. Men guidad sökning är dyrt vid slutningstiden. I detta arbete undersöker vi användningen av förstärkningsinlärning för att träna effektiva meningskompressionsmodeller som också är snabba när man genererar förutsägelser. I synnerhet kastar vi uppgiften som binär sekvensmärkning och finjusterar en färdigutbildad transformator med hjälp av ett enkelt policygradient-tillvägagångssätt. Vårt tillvägagångssätt överträffar andra oövervakade modeller samtidigt som det är effektivare vid inferenstiden.', 'ta': 'வாக்குறுக்கு சுருக்கம் முக்கியமான காரணிகளையும் வரைப்படுத்தும் போது உரையின் நீளத்தையும் நீக்கும் பொழுது மு கண்காணிக்கப்படாத பொருள் இயக்கி செயல்பாடுகள் வாக்கு சுருக்கத்திற்கு தனிப்பயனாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்க பயன்படுத்தலாம், பூமியில் உண்மையான பயிற்ச அண்மையில் காப்பாற்றப்படாத வாக்கு சுருக்கம் நெருங்குகிறது தனிப்பயன் பொருள்களை பயன்படுத்தி வித்தியாசம ஆயினும், நேர்வழி தேடுதல் குறைந்த நேரத்தில் விலையானது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் முன்னோக்குகளை உருவாக்கும் போது வேகமான வாக்கு சுருக்கும் மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய பயன்படுத்தும் வல குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் பணியை இருமுறை வரிசையாக்கி மற்றும் நன்றாக முன்பயிற்சி மாற்றி ஒரு சுலபமான கொள்கை சார்ந்த முறைமை நம்முடைய அணுக்கம் மற்ற பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத மாதிரிகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறது ஆனால் குறைந்த நேரத்தில் அதிக த', 'ur': 'سنت کمپٹینس ٹیکسٹ کی طول کم کر دیتا ہے، غیر ضروری موجود منصوبات کو ہٹا دیتے ہیں، جب کہ اہم حقیقت اور گراماتیکی حفاظت کرتے ہیں. بغیر قابل تعلیم کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق موڈل بنانے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، بغیر زمین-حقیقی تعلیم دادہ کی ضرورت کے، اور موضوع(وں) کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق اگلے غیر قابل تعلق کے مطابق مہربانی کے مطابق خصوصی موجودات کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ مخصوصی تلاش کی راہ دکھائیں۔ لیکن ہدایت یافتہ تلاش کمزور زمانہ میں گرا ہے۔ ہم اس کام میں مضبوط تعلیم کی استعمال کی استعمال کی تلاش کرتے ہیں کہ مثبت فیصلہ مضبوط موڈل کی تعلیم کریں جو پیش بینی پیدا کرنے کے وقت بھی تیز ہیں۔ مخصوصا، ہم نے اس کام کو بیناری سطح لیبلینگ کے طور پر ڈال دیا اور ایک پیش تربین کی تغییر دینے والے کو ایک ساده پولیس گریڈینٹ طریقہ کے مطابق مطابق دکھا دیا۔ ہمارا طریقہ دوسرے غیر محفوظ موڈل سے زیادہ مفید ہوتا ہے حالانکہ وہ بھی زیادہ مفید ہوتا ہے۔', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සංකීර්ණය පාළුවේ වැඩිය අඩංගු කරනවා වැදගත් ඇත්ත සහ ග්\u200dරාම්තිකාරය සඳහා වැදගත් නොවැදගත් සාම වාක්ෂාව සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා අසුප්\u200dරේෂණ් අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත අක්ෂිත විධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වාක්ය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ අවස්ථාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක අක්ෂිත අක නමුත්, ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් බඩු වෙලාවක්. මේ වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජන විශේෂයෙන්, අපි කාර්යය බායිනාරි ක්\u200dරමය ලේබිල් විදියට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයෙක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා  අපේ විදිහට අනිත් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැති විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඒවගේම', 'vi': 'Chỉ cần nén một câu để giảm độ dài của đoạn bằng cách gỡ bỏ các nội dung không cần thiết trong khi giữ lại các dữ kiện và ngôn ngữ. Không giám s át các phương pháp dẫn đầu cho việc nén bản án có thể được dùng để tạo ra các mô hình tự chọn mà không cần dữ liệu huấn luyện thực địa, đồng thời cho phép sự linh hoạt các chức năng mục tiêu được dùng để học và nhận biết. Những phương pháp chịu ép bản án gần đây không được giám sát dùng mục tiêu riêng để hướng dẫn cuộc tìm kiếm riêng; Tuy nhiên, tìm kiếm theo hướng dẫn rất tốn kém. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi khám phá sử dụng các biện pháp củng cố học để huấn luyện các mô hình ép bản án hiệu quả cũng nhanh khi tạo ra dự đoán. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi đặt nhiệm vụ như là hiệu ứng chuỗi nhị phân và hiệu chỉnh một máy biến được huấn luyện trước bằng cách nghiêng chính sách đơn giản. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi thực hiện các mô hình không giám sát khác nhưng cũng hiệu quả hơn trong thời điểm phán đoán.', 'uz': "Name Name @ info Lekin, qo'shilgan qidirish vaqtda qiymatdir. In this work, we explore the use of reinforcement learning to train effective sentence compression models that are also fast when generating predictions.  Hullas, biz vazifani bir xil sezgi sifatida qoidamiz oddiy qoidagi gradient usuli yordamida o'zgartirish birinchi darajasi sifatida bajaramiz. Bizning usuli boshqa saqlab qolmagan modellarni bajaradi va bu vaqtda ko'proq ishlab chiqaradi.", 'da': 'Sætningskompression reducerer tekstens længde ved at fjerne ikke-essentielt indhold, samtidig med at vigtige fakta og grammatik bevares. Ikke-overvågede objektivdrevne metoder til sætningskompression kan bruges til at skabe tilpassede modeller uden behov for grundlæggende træningsdata, samtidig med at der gives fleksibilitet i de objektive funktioner, der bruges til læring og inference. Nylige uovervågede sætningskompressionsmetoder bruger brugerdefinerede mål til at styre diskret søgning. Men guidet søgning er dyrt på konklusionstidspunktet. I dette arbejde undersøger vi brugen af forstærkningslæring til at træne effektive sætningskompressionsmodeller, der også er hurtige, når der genereres forudsigelser. Især kaster vi opgaven som binær sekvensmærkning og finjusterer en forududdannet transformator ved hjælp af en simpel politik gradient tilgang. Vores tilgang overgår andre modeller uden opsyn, samtidig med at den er mere effektiv på sluttidspunktet.', 'bg': 'Компресирането на изречения намалява дължината на текста чрез премахване на несъществено съдържание, като същевременно запазва важни факти и граматичност. Неконтролирани обективни методи за компресиране на изречения могат да се използват за създаване на персонализирани модели без необходимост от данни за обучение на базата на истината, като същевременно се позволява гъвкавост в обективните функции, които се използват за учене и изводи. Последните подходи за компресиране на изречения без надзор използват персонализирани цели за насочване на дискретното търсене; Въпреки това, ръководеното търсене е скъпо по време на заключение. В тази работа изследваме използването на усвояване за обучение на ефективни модели за компресиране на изречения, които също са бързи при генериране на прогнози. По-специално, ние поставяме задачата като етикетиране на двоична последователност и фина настройка на предварително обучен трансформатор, използвайки прост подход на градиента на политиката. Нашият подход надминава други модели без надзор, като същевременно е по-ефективен във времето на заключение.', 'nl': 'Zinncompressie vermindert de lengte van tekst door niet-essentiële inhoud te verwijderen met behoud van belangrijke feiten en grammaticaliteit. Onbewaakte objectief gedreven methoden voor zinscompressie kunnen worden gebruikt om aangepaste modellen te maken zonder de noodzaak van basis-truth trainingsgegevens, terwijl flexibiliteit in de objectieve functie(en) die worden gebruikt voor leren en inferentie. Recente benaderingen van zinscompressie zonder toezicht gebruiken aangepaste doelstellingen om discreet zoeken te begeleiden; Geleid zoeken is echter duur op het moment van conclusie. In dit werk onderzoeken we het gebruik van versterking learning om effectieve zinscompressiemodellen te trainen die ook snel zijn bij het genereren van voorspellingen. In het bijzonder beschouwen we de taak als binaire sequentie labeling en verfijnen we een voorgetrainde transformator met behulp van een eenvoudige beleidsgradiënt benadering. Onze aanpak overtreft andere modellen zonder toezicht en is tegelijkertijd efficiënter op het moment van inferentie.', 'hr': 'Kompresija kazne smanjuje dužinu teksta uklanjanjem neophodnog sadržaja dok čuva važne činjenice i gramatičnost. Neodređene objektivne metode za kompresiju rečenica mogu se koristiti za stvaranje prilagođenih modela bez potrebe za podacima obuke zemaljske istine, dok omogućava fleksibilnost objektivnih funkcija(s) koje se koriste za učenje i infekciju. Nedavno neodređeni pristupi kompresiji rečenica koriste osobne ciljeve za voditi diskretnu potragu; međutim, navedena potraga je skupa u vrijeme infekcije. U ovom poslu istražujemo korištenje učenja pojačanja kako bi obučili učinkovite modele kompresije kazne koje su također brze u stvaranju predviđanja. Posebno smo bacili zadatak kao obilježavanje binarne sekvence i ispravljali predobučenog transformatora koristeći jednostavan pristup političkim pregledima. Naš pristup iznosi druge nepotrebne modele, dok su također učinkovitiji u vrijeme infekcije.', 'de': 'Die Satzkomprimierung reduziert die Textlänge, indem nicht essentielle Inhalte entfernt werden, während wichtige Fakten und Grammatik beibehalten werden. Unbeaufsichtigte objektiv gesteuerte Methoden zur Satzkomprimierung können verwendet werden, um benutzerdefinierte Modelle zu erstellen, ohne dass grundlegende Trainingsdaten benötigt werden, während gleichzeitig Flexibilität in den Zielfunktionen ermöglicht wird, die für Lernen und Inferenzen verwendet werden. Jüngste Ansätze zur unbeaufsichtigten Satzkomprimierung verwenden benutzerdefinierte Ziele, um diskrete Suche zu leiten; Allerdings ist die geführte Suche zum Zeitpunkt der Schlussfolgerung teuer. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir den Einsatz von Verstärkungslernen, um effektive Satzkomprimierungsmodelle zu trainieren, die auch bei der Generierung von Vorhersagen schnell sind. Insbesondere betrachten wir die Aufgabe als Binärsequenzkennzeichnung und verfeinern einen vortrainierten Transformator mit einem einfachen Policy Gradienten Ansatz. Unser Ansatz übertrifft andere unbeaufsichtigte Modelle und ist gleichzeitig effizienter zur Inferenzzeit.', 'fa': 'فشار مجوز طول متن را با حذف محتوای غیر ضروری در حالی که حفاظت حقیقت و گراماتیک مهم می\u200cباشد کاهش می\u200cکند. روش\u200cهای پیش\u200cفرض هدف\u200cای که برای مجبور کردن جمله\u200cها نمی\u200cتوانند برای ایجاد مدل\u200cهای شخصی بدون نیاز به داده\u200cهای آموزش حقیقت زمینی استفاده می\u200cشود، در حالی که اجازه می\u200cدهند flexibility in function(s) هدف\u200cها که برای یادگیری و آلودگی استفاده می\u200cشوند. نزدیک\u200cهای فشار مجازات جدید غیرقابل تأثیر از جمله استفاده از هدف خصوصی برای هدایت جستجوی جدید استفاده می\u200cکند. ولی جستجوی هدایت در زمان بیماری گرون است. در این کار، ما استفاده از یادگیری افزایش را برای آموزش مدلهای فشار جمله موثر تحقیق می کنیم که همچنین در موقع تولید پیش بینی سریع هستند. در خصوص، ما این کار را به عنوان نقاشی ردیابی دویینی و یک تغییرگر پیش آموزش آموزش داده را با استفاده از طریق یک طریق سیاست ساده تغییر می\u200cدهیم. دستور ما از مدل های غیر قابل تحمل انجام می دهد، در حالی که در زمان آلودگی موثرتر بودند.', 'sw': 'Shinikizo la Sensi linapunguza urefu wa maandishi kwa kuondoa maudhui yasiyo ya muhimu wakati wa kuhifadhi ukweli muhimu na ubora. Utawala usiothibitiwa unaotumiwa kwa shinikizo la hukumu unaweza kutumika kutengeneza mifano zilizotumika bila haja ya taarifa za mafunzo ya ukweli, wakati ukiruhusu ujasiri katika kazi(s) zinazotumiwa kwa ajili ya kujifunza na maambukizi. Hivi karibuni, shinikizo la hukumu ambalo halijahifadhiwa linakaribia kutumia malengo ya kawaida ili kuongoza kutafuta tofauti; Hata hivyo, kutafuta uongofu ni ghali kwa wakati wa ugonjwa. Katika kazi hii, tunachunguza matumizi ya kuuza kujifunza kufundisha mifano yenye ufanisi wa hukumu ambayo pia ni haraka wakati wa kutengeneza utabiri. Kwa hakika, tunaweka juhudi kama mfululizo wa mbili na kubadilisha mabadiliko ya zamani kwa kutumia mbinu rahisi za sera. Hatua yetu inaonyesha mifano mingine isiyo na usalama wakati ambapo pia inakuwa na ufanisi zaidi wakati wa maambukizi.', 'tr': 'Sözler sıkıştırmaları möhüm gerçekleri we gramatikleri saglabārken metin uzunluğunu azaltýar. Sözlemek üçin saklanmadyk maksady s üreýän yöntemleri tertiblenen hatlary bejermek üçin ullanylar. Gerçeklik okuwçysy üçin ulanylan maksady(ler) üçin fleksibilitäge rugsat berilýär. Ýakynda maslahat edilmedik sözler sykylamak üçin diskretni gözlemek üçin şahsy maksadlary ullanyr; ýöne gidişik arama wagtynda gymmat gazanýar. Bu işde biz öwrenmek üçin täsirli sözlerin sykylama nusgalaryny öwrenmek üçin ýokarylşyrlygyny gözden çykarýarys. Öňlenmeleri döretýände hem çalt. Biz bu işi iki sany etiketlemek we önünde eğlenen bir terjimeçi şeklinde basit bir politika derejesi bilen taýýarladyk. Biziň ýaryşymyz daşyrylmadyk başga nusgalary daşyrýar, ýöne daşyrlyk wagtynda daşyrlyk ýok bolýar.', 'id': 'Kompresi kalimat mengurangi panjang teks dengan menghapus isi yang tidak penting sambil mempertahankan fakta penting dan gramatikal. Metode objektif tidak diawasi untuk kompresi kalimat dapat digunakan untuk menciptakan model tersendiri tanpa membutuhkan data latihan-kebenaran tanah, sementara memungkinkan fleksibilitas dalam fungsi objektif yang digunakan untuk belajar dan kesimpulan. Pendekatan kompresi kalimat yang baru-baru ini tidak diawasi menggunakan tujuan suai untuk memimpin pencarian diskret; namun, pencarian yang diberi petunjuk mahal pada waktu kesimpulan. In this work, we explore the use of reinforcement learning to train effective sentence compression models that are also fast when generating predictions.  Terutama, kami melemparkan tugas sebagai label urutan binari dan memperbaiki transformer pra-terlatih menggunakan pendekatan gradien kebijakan sederhana. Pendekatan kita melebihi model lain yang tidak diawasi sementara juga lebih efisien pada waktu kesimpulan.', 'af': "Soektog kompressie verduur die lengte van teks deur nie-essential inhoud te verwyder terwyl belangrike fakte en grammatiewe bewaar word. Onondersteunde objektiewe gedrywe metodes vir setkompressie kan gebruik word om pasmaakte modele te skep sonder die benodig vir grond- waarheid onderwerking data, terwyl fleksibiliteit in die objektiewe funksie( s) wat gebruik word vir leer en inferensie. Onlangse onverondersteunde setkompressie toegang gebruik eie doel om diskrete soektog te lei; maar, die getroude soektog is koste by inferensie tyd. In hierdie werk, ondersoek ons die gebruik van versterking leer om effektief setkompressie modele te oefen wat ook vinnig is wanneer voorskoue genereer word. In spesifieke, gegooi ons die taak as binêre sekwensie etiketting en fin-tune 'n vooraf-gevorderde transformeerder deur te gebruik 'n eenvoudige beleid gradient toegang. Ons toegang uitvoer ander ongeonderwerpende modele terwyl ook meer effektief is by inferensie tyd.", 'ko': '문장 압축은 불필요한 내용을 삭제하고 중요한 사실과 문법성을 보존함으로써 텍스트의 길이를 단축시킨다.문장 압축의 무감독 목표 구동 방법은 맞춤형 모델을 만드는 데 사용할 수 있고 지상 진상 훈련 데이터가 필요하지 않으며 학습과 추리에 사용되는 목표 함수도 유연성을 가진다.최근의 무감독 문장 압축 방법은 사용자 정의 목표를 사용하여 이산 검색을 지도한다.그러나 추리할 때 검색을 유도하는 것은 비싸다.이 작업에서 우리는 강화 학습을 사용하여 효과적인 문장 압축 모델을 훈련하는 것을 탐색했는데 이런 모델은 생성 예측을 할 때도 매우 빠르다.특히, 우리는 임무를 2진 시퀀스 표시로 전환하고, 간단한 전략적 계단식 방법으로 미리 훈련된 변환기를 마이크로스피커로 조정합니다.우리의 방법은 다른 무감독 모델보다 우수하며 추리할 때도 더욱 효과적이다.', 'sq': 'Shtypja e dënimeve redukton gjatësinë e tekstit duke hequr përmbajtjen jo-thelbësore duke ruajtur fakte të rëndësishme dhe grammatikën. Metodat objektive të pashqyrura për kompresimin e fjalëve mund të përdoren për të krijuar modele të personalizuara pa nevojën për të dhëna treinimi tokësor-të vërtetës, duke lejuar fleksibilitetin në funksionin objektiv që përdoret për mësimin dhe përfundimin. Përqafimet e fundit të shtypjes së fjalëve të pazgjidhura përdorin objektiva të personalizuara për të udhëzuar kërkimin diskret; megjithatë, kërkimi i udhëzuar është i shtrenjtë në kohën e përfundimit. Në këtë punë, ne eksplorojmë përdorimin e mësimit të forcimit për të trajnuar modele efektive të kompresimit të fjalëve që janë gjithashtu të shpejtë kur krijojnë parashikime. Në veçanti, ne e hedhim detyrën si etiketën e sekuencës binare dhe rregullojmë një transformues të paratrajnuar duke përdorur një metodë të thjeshtë të gradientit të politikës. Përqasja jonë është më e mirë se modelet e tjera të pazgjidhur ndërsa është gjithashtu më e efektshme në kohën e përfundimit.', 'am': "የሥርዓት ጉዳይ የጽሑፉን ርዝመት ማሳሳየት ማስታወቂያውን በማስወገድ እና ማሰናከል የሚያሳድግ ነው። ያልታወቀ አካባቢ የሥርዓት አካባቢ ሥርዓት ለመፍጠር የተለየ ሞዴላዎችን ለመፍጠር ይችላል፤ የመሬት-እውነት ማጠቃለያ ዳታ ሲያስፈልጋል፣ በመማር እና ለማስታወቅ የሚጠቀሙት የአካባቢው функсия(s) ውስጥ ብልሃት እንዲፈቅድ ይችላል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ምንም እንኳን የመራመሩ ፈልግ በጊዜው ዋጋ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ትንቢት ውይይት በመፍጠር ጊዜ የሚቻለውን የቁጥጥር ሞዴላዎችን ለማስተማር የሚጠቅመውን ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ስራውን የሁለተኛ ደረጃዎች እና ቀላል ፖሊሲ ቀዳሚ ሥርዓት በመጠቀም የተቀናቀውን ለውጥ እና ጥሩ እናስቀራለን፡፡ Our approach outperforms other unsupervised models while also being more efficient at inference time.", 'hy': 'Տարբերությունների ճնշումը նվազեցնում է տեքստի երկարությունը՝ վերացնելով ոչ կարևոր պարունակությունը և պահպանելով կարևոր փաստեր և գրամատիկական կարևորություն: Օբյեկտիվ նշանների ճնշումների առանց վերահսկման մեթոդներ կարելի է օգտագործել նախադասությունների ճնշումների ստեղծելու համար անպատասխանատու մոդելներ ստեղծելու համար առանց ստորագույն ուսուցման տվյալների կարիքի, միաժամանակ թույլ տալով ճկունու Վերջերս անվերահսկված նախադասությունների ճնշումների մոտեցումները օգտագործում են անձնական նպատակներ, որպեսզի ուղղություն ունենան անտեսված որոնման համար: այնուամենայնիվ, ուղեկցված որոնումը թանկ է եզրակացության ժամանակ: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ուժեղացված ուսումնասիրության օգտագործումը, որպեսզի ուսուցանենք արդյունավետ նախադասությունների ճնշող մոդելներ, որոնք նաև արագ են առաջացնում կանխատեսումների ստեղծման Հատկապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք այս խնդիրը որպես երկու հաջորդականության պիտակ և բարելավում ենք նախապատրաստված վերափոխողը, օգտագործելով պարզ քաղաքականության աստիճանավոր մոտեցում: Մեր մոտեցումը գերազանցում է այլ անվերահսկված մոդելներին, սակայն նաև ավելի արդյունավետ է դառնում հետևյալների ժամանակ:', 'az': 'Söz sıkışımı mətnin uzunluğunu mövcud faktaları və qrammatik qüdrətini qoruyarkən əsas məlumatları silerek azaldır. Sözlük s ıkıştırması üçün müəyyən edilməmiş məqsədil təhsil edilməmiş metodlar təhsil edilməsi üçün təhsil edilmiş modelləri təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilə bilər, öyrənmək və infeksiya üçün istifadə edilən objektif funksiyaların fleksibiliyyətinə müvəffəq edərkən. Qısqa müəyyən edilməmiş cümlələr sıkıştırma yaxınlıqları müəyyən edilməsi üçün müəyyən məqsədləri istifadə edər; Lakin doğru yol göstərilən araştırma infeksiya vaxtında dəyərlidir. Bu işdə, tədbirləri yaratdığında həm də hızlı cümlələr kompressiya modellərini təhsil etmək üçün yenilənmək öyrənməsini keşfetirik. Özellikle, biz bu işi ikili seçmə etiketi olaraq və əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş transformatörü basit siyasi gradient tərzini ilə müəyyən etdik. Yaxınlığımız həmçinin infeksiya vaxtında daha faydalı olmayan başqa modellərdən üstün gəlir.', 'bn': 'গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্য এবং গ্রামাটিক্যালিটি সংরক্ষণের মাধ্যমে শাস্তি সম্পূর্ণ লেখার দৈর্ঘ্য কমিয়ে দেয়। বাক্য সম্পাদনের জন্য অপারেশনযোগ্য উদ্দেশ্য পরিচালিত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করা যাবে স্বনির্ধারিত মডেল তৈরি করার জন্য কোনো প্রয়োজন না থাকে, যদিও অবজেক্ট ফাংশন( গুল সম্প্রতি সংরক্ষিত বাক্য সম্পাদনা সম্পর্কে বিভিন্ন অনুসন্ধানের জন্য স্বনির্ধারিত উদ্দেশ্য ব্যবহার করা হবে; তবে পরিচালিত অনুসন্ধানের সময় অসুস্থ সময়ে দাম। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা ব্যবহার করি কার্যকর শিক্ষা ব্যবহারের ব্যবহার, যারা ভবিষ্যৎবাণী তৈরি করার সময় কার্যকর শাস্তি প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করে  বিশেষ করে, আমরা কাজ বাইনারি সেকেন্ড লেবেলিং হিসেবে চালিয়ে দিয়েছি এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত পরিবর্তনের একটি সাধারণ নীতি গ্রেডেন আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা অন্যান্য অরক্ষিত মডেল প্রকাশ করে এবং তারা অসুসংক্রান্ত সময়ে আরো কার্যকর।', 'bs': 'Kompresija kazne smanjuje dužinu teksta uklanjanjem neophodnog sadržaja dok čuva važne činjenice i gramatičnost. Neodređene objektivne metode za kompresiju rečenice mogu se koristiti za stvaranje prilagođenih modela bez potrebe za podacima obuke zemaljske istine, dok omogućava fleksibilnost objektivne funkcije(e) koje se koriste za učenje i infekciju. Nedavno neodređeni pristupi kompresiji rečenica koriste obične ciljeve za voditi diskretnu potragu; međutim, navedena potraga je skupa u vrijeme infekcije. U ovom poslu istražujemo korištenje učenja pojačanja kako bi obučili efikasne modele kompresije kazne koje su također brze u stvaranju predviđanja. Posebno, bacili smo zadatak kao etiketiranje binarne sekvence i ispravljali predobučenog transformatora koristeći jednostavan pristup političkim gradientima. Naš pristup iznosi druge neodređene modele, a također je učinkovitiji u vrijeme infekcije.', 'ca': "La compressió de frases redueix la llargada del text eliminant continguts no essencials mentre conserven fets importants i gramàtics. Els mètodes objectius no supervisats de compressió de frases poden ser utilitzats per crear models personalitzats sense la necessitat de dades d'entrenament de veritat terrestre, mentre permeten flexibilitat en la funció objectiva(s) que s'utilitzen per aprendre i inferir. Els enfocaments de compressió de frases poc supervisades recents utilitzen objectius personalitzats per guiar la cerca discreta; però la recerca guiada és cara en temps de inferència. In this work, we explore the use of reinforcement learning to train effective sentence compression models that are also fast when generating predictions.  En particular, fem la tasca com etiqueta de seqüència binaria i ajustem un transformador pré-entrenat fent servir un enfocament simplement gradient de política. El nostre enfocament supera altres models sense supervisió mentre també és més eficient en temps de inferència.", 'cs': 'Komprese vět snižuje délku textu odstraněním nepodstatného obsahu při zachování důležitých faktů a gramatiky. Nekontrolované objektivně řízené metody komprese vět lze použít k vytváření přizpůsobených modelů bez potřeby základních tréninkových dat, přičemž umožňují flexibilitu v funkci (funkcích), které se používají pro učení a odvoz. Nedávné přístupy k kompresi vět bez dozoru používají vlastní cíle k řízení diskrétního vyhledávání; Nicméně řízené vyhledávání je v době závěru drahé. V této práci zkoumáme využití zesilovacího učení k trénování efektivních modelů komprese vět, které jsou také rychlé při generování predikcí. Především považujeme úkol za značení binárních sekvencí a jemně ladíme předškolený transformátor pomocí jednoduchého přístupu k gradientům politiky. Náš přístup překonává ostatní modely bez dohledu a zároveň je efektivnější v době odvozu.', 'et': 'Lause tihendamine vähendab teksti pikkust, eemaldades ebaolulise sisu, säilitades samas olulised faktid ja grammatilisus. Järelevalveta objektiivseid meetodeid lausete tihendamiseks saab kasutada kohandatud mudelite loomiseks, ilma et oleks vaja põhjalikku koolitusandmeid, võimaldades samal ajal paindlikkust objektiivsete funktsioonide osas, mida kasutatakse õppimiseks ja järeldusteks. Hiljutised järelevalveta lausete tihendamise meetodid kasutavad diskreetse otsingu juhtimiseks kohandatud eesmärke; Kuid juhitud otsing on järelduse ajal kallis. Käesolevas töös uurime tugevdusõppe kasutamist efektiivsete lausetihendusmudelite koolitamiseks, mis on kiired ka ennustuste genereerimisel. Eelkõige esitame ülesande kahekordse järjestuse märgistusena ja häälestame eelkoolitud trafo lihtsa poliitilise gradienti lähenemisviisi abil. Meie lähenemisviis ületab teisi järelevalveta mudeleid, olles samas tulemuslikum ka järelduste ajal.', 'fi': 'Lausekkeen pakkaaminen vähentää tekstin pituutta poistamalla ei-olennaista sisältöä säilyttäen samalla tärkeät tosiasiat ja kieliopillisuus. Tarkkailemattomia objektiivisia menetelmiä lauseiden pakkaamiseen voidaan käyttää räätälöityjen mallien luomiseen ilman, että tarvitaan perustietoja, ja samalla mahdollistaa joustavuuden objektiivisissa toiminnoissa, joita käytetään oppimiseen ja päättelyyn. Viimeaikaiset valvomattomat lauseiden pakkausmenetelmät käyttävät mukautettuja tavoitteita ohjaamaan erillistä hakua; Ohjattu haku on kuitenkin kallista päättelyhetkellä. Tässä työssä tutkitaan vahvistusoppimisen käyttöä tehokkaiden lausekompressiomallien kouluttamiseen, jotka ovat nopeita myös ennusteiden tuottamisessa. Erityisesti teemme tehtävän binäärisekvenssimerkintöinä ja hienosäädämme valmiiksi koulutettua muuntajaa yksinkertaisella gradientti-lähestymistavalla. Lähestymistapamme päihittää muut valvomattomat mallit ja on samalla tehokkaampi päättelyhetkellä.', 'jv': 'Ngucap Algorithm politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging, dibutuhke manut karo akeh luwih dumateng. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné isih perusahaan nggawe lan uga njacara nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe modèl kuwi ampuhé perusahaan winih kanggo mbara supoyo nggawe lanjut winih. In special, we cast the task as binary order label and Fin-tune a before-cured transformer with a Simple policy gradient method. Ndheke nambah sing wis mbut maneh model sing gak ora bisa perusahaan, sampeyan ngono iso nggawe layang kanggo ngerasakno.', 'ha': "Tsarin zartar da shi, yana ƙara tsawo na matsayi da cire tsari da tsari masu muhimu da grammati. @ action: button @ info: whatsthis Kayya, in da aka shiryar da shi, sai ya fi kyauta a lokacin kasanci. Daga wannan aikin, munã yin amfani da amfani da ƙarani da za'a sanar da misãlai ga muhimmanci masu amfani da shi, da kuma masu haraka idan za'a ƙara bayani. A cikin ƙayyade, za'a jẽfa aikin da za'a lissafa sauri biyu kuma muna bada wata shida mai gabatar da ta yi amfani da wata hanyarwa mai sauƙi na rayi. Mataimakinmu na sami wasu misãlai wanda ba'a tsare shi ba da kuma yana da mafiya amfani ga lokacin da ba'a yi matafiya ba.", 'he': 'לחיצת משפט מפחידה את אורך הטקסט על ידי הסירה של תוכן לא חיוני בזמן שמירה עובדות חשובות וגרמטיקה. שיטות מונעות אובייקטיביות ללא פיקוח לחיצת משפטים יכולות להשתמש כדי ליצור דוגמנים מתאימים ללא הצורך למידע האימונים האדמה-אמת, בזמן שאפשר גמישות בתפקיד(ים) האובייקטיבי אשר משתמשים ללימוד ומסקנה. גישות לחיצת משפטים לא מעוקבות לאחרונה משתמשות במטרות מתאימות כדי להדריך חיפוש דיסקרטי; בכל אופן, חיפוש מודרך יקר בזמן המסקנה. בעבודה הזו, אנו חוקרים את השימוש של לימוד התגבורה לאימון דוגמני לחיצת משפטים יעילים שגם מהירים כשיוצרים חזיונות. In particular, we cast the task as binary sequence labelling and fine-tune a pre-trained transformer using a simple policy gradient approach.  הגישה שלנו מוגבלת מודלים אחרים שלא משגיחים בזמן שהיא גם יעילה יותר בזמן המסקנה.', 'sk': 'Stiskanje stavkov zmanjšuje dolžino besedila z odstranjevanjem nebistvenih vsebin, hkrati pa ohranja pomembna dejstva in slovničnost. Nenadzorovane objektivno usmerjene metode za stiskanje stavkov se lahko uporabljajo za ustvarjanje prilagojenih modelov brez potrebe po podatkih o usposabljanju resnice, hkrati pa omogočajo fleksibilnost objektivnih funkcij, ki se uporabljajo za učenje in sklepanje. Nedavni nenadzorovani pristopi stiskanja stavkov uporabljajo cilje po meri za usmerjanje diskretnega iskanja; Vendar pa je vodeno iskanje drago v času sklepanja. V tem delu raziskujemo uporabo ojačitvenega učenja za usposabljanje učinkovitih modelov stiskanja stavkov, ki so hitri tudi pri ustvarjanju napovedi. Predvsem nalogo opredelimo kot označevanje binarnega zaporedja in natančno nastavimo vnaprej usposobljeni transformator s preprostim pristopom gradienta politike. Naš pristop presega druge nenadzorovane modele, hkrati pa je učinkovitejši v času sklepanja.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཚིག རང་བཟོས་ཅན་མེད་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་ཚིག་མཐའ་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཐུབ་པ་ལས་རང་བཟོ་སྒྲིག ད་ལྟ་མི་ཕར་བཟོས་མེད་པའི་ཚིག་རྡེབ་ཕུང་བཤེར་དང་རང་བཟོས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་སྤྱོད་པ འོན་ཀྱང་། འགོ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ནི་དུས་ཚོད་སྐྱུར་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་mal ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཆེན་པོ་སྤྱད་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་རྩོལ་ནུས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོལ In particular, we cast the task as binary sequence labelling and fine-tune a pre-trained transformer using a simple policy gradient approach. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱིས་མི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་གཞན་ཞིག་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞན་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Unified Structure Generation for Universal Information Extraction', 'ar': 'تتبع الأصول: فهم القراءة الآلي للوعي', 'pt': 'Origens de rastreamento: compreensão de leitura de máquina com reconhecimento de correferência', 'fr': 'Tracing Origins\xa0: Compréhension de lecture automatique compatible avec les coréférences', 'es': 'Rastreando orígenes: comprensión de lectura automática con conciencia de referencias', 'ja': 'トレーシングの起源：コアリファレンスを意識した機械読取りの理解', 'hi': 'ट्रेसिंग मूल: Coreference-जागरूक मशीन पढ़ने की समझ', 'ru': 'Отслеживание происхождения: осмысление машинного чтения с опорой на ядро', 'zh': '踪迹起源,共解感知机器读解', 'ga': 'Bunús a Rianú: Tuiscint Léamh Innealra atá feasach ar chroílár', 'ka': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'el': 'Εντοπισμός προέλευσης: Συνειδητοποιημένη κατανόηση ανάγνωσης μηχανών', 'hu': 'Eredetek nyomon követése: Coreferencia-tudatos gépi olvasási értékelés', 'it': 'Tracing Origins: Comprensione di lettura automatica consapevole della coreferenza', 'kk': 'Сіздеу шығармалары: Машина оқу құралы', 'lt': 'Stebėsenos kilmė: su atitiktimi žinomas mašinų skaitymo suvokimas', 'mk': 'Истражување на потекло: Механично читање', 'ms': 'Sumber Pengjejak: Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin yang sedar-samaran', 'ml': 'പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന സൂചനകള്\u200d: കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ്- അറിയുന്ന മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുതുക്കം', 'mt': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'mn': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'no': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'pl': 'Tracing Origins: Zrozumienie odczytu maszynowego', 'sr': 'Praćenje Originala: Komplikacija za èitanje mašine', 'so': 'Raadi asalka: Koreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'sv': 'Spåra ursprung: Coreference-medveten maskinläsförståelse', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණා ප්\u200dරදේශය: Corephern-Know machine Reading Compremance', 'ta': 'பயிற்சி மூலங்கள்:', 'ur': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'ro': 'Urmărirea originilor: Înțelegerea citirii mașinilor conștiente de corefență', 'uz': 'Tugmalar birikmasi:', 'vi': 'Định vị nguồn:', 'da': 'Sporing af oprindelser: Coreference-bevidst maskinlæsning forståelse', 'nl': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-bewust inzicht in machinelezen', 'hr': 'Praćenje Originala: Komplikacija za čitanje strojeva', 'bg': 'Проследяване на произхода: Разбиране на машинното четене, осъзнаващо кореференцията', 'de': 'Tracing Origins: Coreferenz-bewusstes Verständnis für maschinelles Lesen', 'id': 'Origin Penjejak: Pembacaan Mesin yang sadar tentang kebenaran', 'ko': '소원: 공지 식별의 기계 읽기 이해', 'fa': 'ردیابی اولین: تأثیر خواندن ماشین Coreference-aware', 'tr': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'sw': 'Kufuatilia Asili: Mashine ya Kusoma Uwezeshaji', 'sq': 'Origjinat e ndjekjes: Komprehimi i makinës së leximit me njohuri për koreferencën', 'af': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'am': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'hy': 'Հետևողության ծագումը. համաձայն գիտակցող մեքենայի ընթերցման ընկալումը', 'az': 'ƒ∞zl…ôm…ô Originl…ôri: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'bn': 'অনুসন্ধানের উদ্দেশ্য: কোরেফারেন্স- সচেতন মেশিন পাঠ করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'cs': 'Sledování původů: Rozumění strojového čtení s ohledem na Coreference', 'bs': 'Praćenje Originala: Komplikacija za čitanje mašina', 'et': 'Jälgimise algupärad: koreference-teadlik masinlugemise arusaam', 'fi': 'Jäljityksen alkuperät: Coreference-tietoinen konelukemisen ymmärtäminen', 'jv': 'tracing Original: corefern-awake Masine Reading Compréncion', 'sk': 'Izvori sledenja: razumevanje strojnega branja, ki se zaveda Coreference', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension', 'bo': 'Tracing Origins: Coreference-aware Machine Reading Comprehension'}
{'en': 'Information extraction suffers from its varying targets heterogeneous structures and demand specific schemas In this paper we propose a unified text to structure generation framework namely UIE which can universally model different IE tasks adaptively generate targeted structures and collaboratively learn general IE abilities from different knowledge sources Specifically UIE uniformly encodes different extraction structures via a structured extraction language adaptively generates target extractions via a schema based prompt mechanism   structural schema instructor and captures the common IE abilities via a large scale pretrained text to structure model Experiments show that UIE achieved the state of the art performance on IE tasks datasets and on all supervised low resource and few shot settings for a wide range of entity relation event and sentiment extraction tasks and their unification These results verified the effectiveness universality and transferability of UIE', 'ar': 'فهم قراءة الآلة هو مجال بحث واختبار تمت دراسته بشكل مكثف لتقييم نماذج اللغة الجديدة المدربة مسبقًا (PrLMs) واستراتيجيات الضبط الدقيق ، وقد أثرت الدراسات الحديثة نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا بالمعلومات النحوية والدلالية وغيرها من المعلومات اللغوية لتحسينها. أداء النماذج. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتقليد عملية القراءة البشرية في ربط التعبيرات الجذابة والاستفادة بشكل صريح من المعلومات المرجعية للكيانات لتعزيز كلمة التضمينات من نموذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا ، من أجل تسليط الضوء على الإشارات المرجعية للكيانات التي يجب أن تكون تم تحديدها للإجابة على الأسئلة التي تتطلب الكثير من المرجعيات في QUOREF ، وهي مجموعة بيانات جديدة نسبيًا تم تصميمها خصيصًا لتقييم أداء النموذج المرتبط بالمرجع المرجعي. نحن نستخدم استراتيجيتين لضبط نموذج لغة مدرب مسبقًا ، وهما وضع طبقة تشفير إضافية بعد نموذج لغة مدرب مسبقًا للتركيز على الإشارات المرجعية أو إنشاء شبكة تلافيفية للرسم البياني العلائقي لنمذجة العلاقات المرجعية. نوضح أن التضمين الصريح للمعلومات المرجعية في مرحلة الضبط الدقيق يؤدي بشكل أفضل من دمج معلومات المرجع في التدريب المسبق لنموذج اللغة.', 'fr': "La compréhension de la lecture automatique est un domaine de recherche et de test très étudié pour évaluer de nouveaux modèles de langage pré-entraînés (PRLM) et des stratégies de réglage précis, et des études récentes ont enrichi les modèles de langage pré-entraînés avec des informations syntaxiques, sémantiques et autres informations linguistiques pour améliorer les performances du modèles. Dans cet article, nous imitons le processus de lecture humaine en connectant les expressions anaphoriques et exploitons explicitement les informations de coréférence des entités pour améliorer les intégrations de mots à partir du modèle de langage pré-formé, afin de mettre en évidence les mentions de coréférence des entités qui doivent être identifiées pour répondre à des questions intensives en coréférence dans QUOREF, un ensemble de données relativement nouveau spécialement conçu pour évaluer les performances liées aux coréférences d'un modèle. Nous utilisons deux stratégies pour affiner un modèle de langage pré-entraîné, à savoir placer une couche d'encodeur supplémentaire après un modèle de langage préformé pour se concentrer sur les mentions de coréférence ou construire un réseau convolutif de graphe relationnel pour modéliser les relations de coréférence. Nous démontrons que l'incorporation explicite d'informations de coréférence lors de l'étape de réglage fin est plus efficace que l'incorporation des informations de coréférence lors de la pré-formation d'un modèle linguistique.", 'pt': 'A compreensão de leitura de máquina é um campo de pesquisa e teste muito estudado para avaliar novos modelos de linguagem pré-treinados (PrLMs) e estratégias de ajuste fino, e estudos recentes enriqueceram os modelos de linguagem pré-treinados com informações sintáticas, semânticas e outras linguísticas para melhorar o desempenho dos modelos. Neste artigo, imitamos o processo de leitura humana ao conectar as expressões anafóricas e explicitamente alavancamos as informações de correferência das entidades para aprimorar os embeddings de palavras do modelo de linguagem pré-treinado, a fim de destacar as menções de correferência das entidades que devem ser identificado para resposta a perguntas com uso intensivo de correferência no QUOREF, um conjunto de dados relativamente novo que é projetado especificamente para avaliar o desempenho relacionado à correferência de um modelo. Usamos duas estratégias para ajustar um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado, ou seja, colocar uma camada de codificador adicional após um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado para focar nas menções de correferência ou construir uma rede convolucional de grafo relacional para modelar as relações de correferência. Demonstramos que a incorporação explícita de informações de correferência no estágio de ajuste fino tem um desempenho melhor do que a incorporação de informações de correferência no pré-treinamento de um modelo de linguagem.', 'es': 'La comprensión de lectura automática es un campo de investigación y prueba muy estudiado para evaluar nuevos modelos lingüísticos preentrenados (PRLM) y afinar estrategias, y estudios recientes han enriquecido los modelos lingüísticos preentrenados con información sintáctica, semántica y otra información lingüística para mejorar el rendimiento del modelos. En este artículo, imitamos el proceso de lectura humana al conectar las expresiones anafóricas y aprovechamos explícitamente la información de correferencia de las entidades para mejorar las incrustaciones de palabras del modelo de lenguaje preentrenado, con el fin de resaltar las menciones de correferencia de las entidades que deben identificarse para respuestas a preguntas intensivas en coreferencia en QUOREF, un conjunto de datos relativamente nuevo que está diseñado específicamente para evaluar el rendimiento relacionado con la correferencia de un modelo. Utilizamos dos estrategias para ajustar un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado, a saber, colocar una capa de codificador adicional después de un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado para centrarse en las menciones de correferencia o construir una red convolucional de gráficos relacionales para modelar las relaciones de correferencia. Demostramos que la incorporación explícita de información de correferencia en la etapa de ajuste funciona mejor que la incorporación de la información de correferencia en el entrenamiento previo de un modelo de lenguaje.', 'ja': '機械読解理解は、新しい事前訓練された言語モデル（ PrLM ）と微調整戦略を評価するための研究とテストの分野であり、最近の研究では、事前訓練された言語モデルを構文、意味論、および他の言語情報で充実させ、モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させている。 本稿では，アナフォリック表現を接続する際のヒューマンリーディングプロセスを模倣し，実体のコアレファレンス情報を明示的に活用して，事前に訓練された言語モデルからの単語埋め込みを強化し，コアレファレンス関連のパフォーマンスを評価するために特別に設計された比較的新しいデータセットであるQUOREFにおけるコアレファレンス集約的質問回答のために特定されなければならない実体のコアレファレンス言及を強調する． 私たちは、事前に訓練された言語モデルを微調整するために2つの戦略を使用します。つまり、事前に訓練された言語モデルの後に追加のエンコーダ層を配置して、コアレファレンスが言及することに焦点を当てるか、またはコアレファレンス関係をモデル化するための関係グラフ畳み込みネットワークを構築します。 微調整段階でのコアリファレンス情報の明示的な組み込みは、言語モデルの事前トレーニングでのコアリファレンス情報の組み込みよりも優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを実証した。', 'zh': '机器读解者,深究领域,以料新预训语(PrLM)微调之策,近者究已用句法,语义与诸语言信息丰其言语,以重其能。 于本文中,仿接泛义表达式人读之迹,明用实体之共指以增习言语模形之词嵌之,以显于QUORREF之必识者凡指引提及,此一对较新之数集,专以评估模形之协引相关性能也。 吾以二策微调预训语模形,即于预练之后置一额外编码器层,以专注共指提及,或构图卷积网络以建模共指。 臣等证明微调显式并共推理信息,比于言语模形预练引入共推理信息之性更佳。', 'hi': 'मशीन रीडिंग समझ नए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल (PrLMs) और ठीक-ट्यूनिंग रणनीतियों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक भारी अध्ययन किया गया अनुसंधान और परीक्षण क्षेत्र है, और हाल के अध्ययनों ने मॉडल के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए वाक्यात्मक, शब्दार्थ और अन्य भाषाई जानकारी के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को समृद्ध किया है। इस पेपर में, हम एनाफोरिक अभिव्यक्तियों को जोड़ने में मानव पढ़ने की प्रक्रिया की नकल करते हैं और स्पष्ट रूप से पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल से शब्द एम्बेडिंग को बढ़ाने के लिए संस्थाओं की सह-संदर्भ जानकारी का लाभ उठाते हैं, ताकि उन संस्थाओं के कोरफेरेंस उल्लेखों को उजागर किया जा सके जिन्हें कोआरईएफ में कोरफेरेंस-गहन प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए पहचाना जाना चाहिए, एक अपेक्षाकृत नया डेटासेट जो विशेष रूप से एक मॉडल के सह-सम्मेलन से संबंधित प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। हम एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को ठीक करने के लिए दो रणनीतियों का उपयोग करते हैं, अर्थात्, एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के बाद एक अतिरिक्त एनकोडर परत को कोरफेरेंस का उल्लेख करने या सह-संदर्भ संबंधों को मॉडल करने के लिए एक संबंधपरक ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क का निर्माण करने के लिए। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि ठीक-ट्यूनिंग चरण में सह-संदर्भित जानकारी का स्पष्ट निगमन पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण एक भाषा मॉडल में सह-सम्मेलन जानकारी के निगमन की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Понимание машинного чтения - это хорошо изученная область исследований и испытаний для оценки новых предварительно обученных языковых моделей (PrLM) и стратегий точной настройки, а недавние исследования обогатили предварительно обученные языковые модели синтаксической, семантической и другой языковой информацией для улучшения производительности моделей. В этой статье мы имитируем процесс чтения человеком при соединении анафорических выражений и явным образом используем базовую информацию сущностей для улучшения вложений слов из предварительно обученной языковой модели, чтобы выделить базовые упоминания сущностей, которые должны быть идентифицированы для ответа на ключевой вопрос в QUOREF, относительно новом наборе данных, который специально разработан для оценки производительности модели, связанной с базовой ориентацией. Мы используем две стратегии для тонкой настройки предварительно обученной языковой модели, а именно, размещение дополнительного слоя кодера после предварительно обученной языковой модели для фокусировки на упоминаниях о базовой ориентации или построение реляционной графовой сверточной сети для моделирования отношений базовой ориентации. Мы демонстрируем, что явное включение базовой информации на этапе тонкой настройки работает лучше, чем включение базовой информации при предварительном обучении языковой модели.', 'ga': "Is réimse taighde agus tástála dian-staidéar í an ríomhthuiscint chun samhlacha nua teanga réamhoilte (PrLManna) agus straitéisí mionchoigeartaithe a mheas, agus tá staidéir le déanaí tar éis na múnlaí teanga réamhoilte a shaibhriú le faisnéis chomhréire, shéimeantach agus teangeolaíoch eile a fheabhsú. feidhmíocht na samhlacha. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid aithris ar phróiseas léitheoireachta an duine maidir leis na habairtí anaiféaracha a nascadh agus faisnéis chroílár na n-eintiteas a ghiaráil go sainráite chun leabú na bhfocal ón múnla teanga réamh-oilte a fheabhsú, d'fhonn aird a tharraingt ar chroílár na n-eintiteas nach mór a lua. sainaitheanta le haghaidh freagra ceiste dian-lárnach in QUOREF, tacar sonraí réasúnta nua atá deartha go sonrach chun feidhmíocht mhúnla a bhaineann le croí-chomhdhálacha a mheas. Bainimid úsáid as dhá straitéis chun mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar mhúnla teanga réamh-oilte, is é sin, ciseal ionchódóra breise a chur i ndiaidh múnla teanga réamh-oilte chun díriú ar na tagairtí croí-chomhdhála nó gréasán comhdhlúite graf choibhneasta a thógáil chun an caidreamh croíláir a shamhaltú. Léirímid go bhfeidhmíonn ionchorprú sainráite na faisnéise croí-chomhdhála sa chéim mhionchoigeartaithe níos fearr ná ionchorprú na buneolais i múnla teanga a réamh-oiliúint.", 'ka': 'მაქსინური კითხვის შესახებ არის ძალიან სწავლილი პასუხი და ტესტის ფონდი, რომელიც ახალი პროგრამეტური ენის მოდელები (PrLMs) და სწავლის კონფიგურაციის სტრატიგიები, და ახალი სწავლის მოდელები უფრო მეტივალეთ ენის მოდელები სინტაქტიული, ჟენმა ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ ადამიანის კითხვის პროცესი ანაფორიკური გამოსახულების დაკავშირებაში და გამოსახულებელად ინტერციების შესახულებელი ინფორმაციის ინფორმაციის ინფორმაციას გამოიყენებთ, რომ საუბრალოდ საუბრალოდ განახულებული ენის მოდელიდან სიტყვების შესახულება, რომელიც უნდა იცნ პარამეტრებით ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული იყო მოდელის კონფიგურაციას. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ორი სტრატიგური სახელის მოდელს, რომელიც დამატებული კოდერების ნაწილის შემდეგ დამატებული ენის მოდელს, რომელიც დამატებული ენის მოდელზე დამატებული ენის მოდელზე, რომელიც კონტროლური გრაფიკის კონტროლური ქსელის შესა ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მსგავსი ინფორმაციის გამოყენება წარმოადგენების სტაციის სტაციაში უფრო მეტია, ვიდრე მსგავსი ინფორმაციის დაყენება წარმოადგენების მოდელში.', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης είναι ένα πολύ μελετημένο πεδίο έρευνας και δοκιμών για την αξιολόγηση νέων προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων (και στρατηγικών συντονισμού), ενώ πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν εμπλουτίσει τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα με συντακτικές, σημασιολογικές και άλλες γλωσσικές πληροφορίες για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης των μοντέλων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, μιμείται την ανθρώπινη διαδικασία ανάγνωσης στη σύνδεση των αναφορικών εκφράσεων και αξιοποιεί ρητά τις πληροφορίες των οντοτήτων για την ενίσχυση της ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων από το προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο, προκειμένου να τονιστούν οι αναφορές των οντοτήτων που πρέπει να αναγνωριστούν για την απάντηση εντατικών ερωτήσεων στο QUOREF, ένα σχετικά νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που έχει σχεδιαστεί ειδικά για την αξιολόγηση των επιδόσεων ενός μοντέλου που σχετίζονται με τη συνάφεια. Χρησιμοποιούμε δύο στρατηγικές για την τελειοποίηση ενός προ-εκπαιδευμένου γλωσσικού μοντέλου, δηλαδή την τοποθέτηση ενός πρόσθετου στρώματος κωδικοποιητή μετά από ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο για να επικεντρωθούμε στις αναφορές συγχορήγησης ή την κατασκευή ενός σχεσιακού δικτύου συστολής γραφήματος για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τις σχέσεις συγχορήγησης. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι η ρητή ενσωμάτωση των πληροφοριών της συνάφειας στο στάδιο της τελειοποίησης αποδίδει καλύτερα από την ενσωμάτωση των πληροφοριών της συνάφειας στην προεκπαίδευση ενός γλωσσικού μοντέλου.', 'hu': 'A gépi olvasás megértése egy erősen tanulmányozott kutatási és tesztterület az új, előre képzett nyelvi modellek (PrLM) és finomhangolási stratégiák értékelésére, és a legutóbbi tanulmányok gazdagították az előre képzett nyelvi modelleket szintaktikai, szemantikai és egyéb nyelvi információkkal a modellek teljesítményének javítása érdekében. Jelen tanulmányban az anafórikus kifejezések összekapcsolásában utánozzuk az emberi olvasási folyamatot, és kifejezetten kihasználjuk az entitások coreferencia információit az előképzett nyelvi modellből származó szóbeágyazások fokozására, hogy kiemeljük azoknak az entitásoknak a coreferencia említéseit, amelyeket a QUOREF-ben a coreferencia intenzív kérdésekre kell azonosítani, egy viszonylag új adatkészlet, amelyet kifejezetten egy modell coreferenciával kapcsolatos teljesítményének értékelésére terveztek. Két stratégiát használunk egy előre képzett nyelvi modell finomhangolására, nevezetesen egy további kódoló réteget helyezünk el egy előre képzett nyelvi modell után, hogy a coreferencia említésekre összpontosítsunk, vagy egy relációs gráf konvolúciós hálózatot építsünk fel a coreferencia kapcsolatok modellezésére. Bemutatjuk, hogy a coreferencia információk finomhangolási szakaszban történő kifejezett beépítése jobban teljesít, mint a coreferencia információk beépítése egy nyelvi modell előképzésébe.', 'it': "La comprensione della lettura automatica è un campo di ricerca e test molto studiato per valutare nuovi modelli linguistici pre-formati (PrLM) e strategie di messa a punto, e recenti studi hanno arricchito i modelli linguistici pre-formati con informazioni sintattiche, semantiche e altre informazioni linguistiche per migliorare le prestazioni dei modelli. In questo articolo, imitiamo il processo di lettura umana nel collegare le espressioni anaforiche e sfruttiamo esplicitamente le informazioni di coreferenza delle entità per migliorare le incorporazioni di parole dal modello linguistico pre-addestrato, al fine di evidenziare le menzioni di coreferenza delle entità che devono essere identificate per rispondere alle domande ad alta intensità di coreferenza in QUOREF, un set di dati relativamente nuovo specificamente progettato per valutare le prestazioni correlate alla coreferenza di un modello. Usiamo due strategie per perfezionare un modello linguistico pre-addestrato, vale a dire, posizionare un ulteriore livello di encoder dopo un modello linguistico pre-addestrato per concentrarsi sulle menzioni di coreferenza o costruire una rete convoluzionale del grafico relazionale per modellare le relazioni di coreferenza. Dimostriamo che l'inclusione esplicita delle informazioni di coreferenza nella fase di fine tuning funziona meglio dell'incorporazione delle informazioni di coreferenza nella preparazione di un modello linguistico.", 'lt': 'Mašininio skaitymo supratimas yra labai ištirta mokslinių tyrimų ir bandymų sritis, skirta įvertinti naujus iš anksto parengtus kalbos modelius (angl. pre-trained language models, PrLMs) ir tobulinimo strategijas, o neseniai atlikti tyrimai praturtino iš anksto parengtus kalbos modelius sintaktine, semantine ir kita kalbine informacija, siekiant pagerinti modelių veiksmingumą. Šiame dokumente imituojame žmogaus skaitymo procesą sujungiant anaforines išraiškas ir aiškiai naudojame subjektų informacijos apie atitiktį, kad sustiprintume išankstinio mokymo kalbos modelio žodžių įtraukimą, siekiant pabrėžti subjektų, kurie turi būti identifikuoti atsižvelgiant į atitikties intensyvumą atsakant į QUOREF klausimus, atitiktį, - palyginti naują duomenų rinkinį, specialiai suprojektuotą su atitiktimi susijusioms modelio savybėms įvertinti. Naudojame dvi strategijas iš anksto parengtam kalbos modeliui patobulinti, t. y. papildomo kodavimo sluoksnio nustatymą po iš anksto parengto kalbos modelio, kad sutelktume dėmesį į koreferencijos paminėjimus arba santykinio grafiko konvoliucinio tinklo kūrimą koreferenciniams santykiams modeliuoti. Mes įrodome, kad aiškiai įtraukus koreferencinę informaciją patobulinimo etape rezultatai yra geresni nei įtraukiant koreferencinę informaciją į ankstyvąjį kalbos model į.', 'mk': 'Разбирање на машинското читање е тешко студирано истражување и тестирање поле за евалуирање на новите предобучени јазични модели (PrLMs) и стратегии за финетизирање, а неодамнешните студии ги збогатија предобучените јазични модели со синтактички, семантични и други јазични информации за подобрување на резултатите Во овој весник, го имитираме процесот на човечко читање во поврзувањето на анафорските изрази и експлицитно ги искористуваме информациите за соодветност на ентитетите за подобрување на зборовите вградени од предобучениот јазички модел, со цел да ги истакнеме спомените за соодветност на ентитетите кои мора да се идентификуваат за соодветно интензивно одговорување на праша Релативно нов датотек кој е специфично дизајниран за проценка на резултатите поврзани со соодветноста на моделот. Ние користиме две стратегии за финетизирање на предобучениот јазички модел, имено, ставање дополнителен кодирачки слој по предобучениот јазички модел за фокусирање на спомените на кореференцијата или изградба на конволуционална мрежа на релативниот граф за моделирање на односите на кореференцијата. Демонстрираме дека експлицитното вклопување на информациите за соодветност во фазата на финетизирање е подобро отколку вклопувањето на информациите за соодветност во предобуката на јазичкиот модел.', 'kk': 'Машина оқу түсініктері - жаңа алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілерін (PrLMs) және қарапайым баптау стратегияларын оқу үшін қатты зерттеу және сынақтар өрісі. Соңғы зерттеулері үлгілерді жақсы, синтактикалық, семантикалық және басқа лингвистикалық мәлімет Бұл қағазда, адамдарды оқу процесін анафориялық өрнектерді қосып, QUOREF-де сұрақтардың жауап беру үшін керек сұрақтарды таңдау үшін, адамдардың оқу процесін түсіндіреміз. Өзгертілген жаңа деректер жинағы үлгісінің қасиеттері жұмысын оқу үшін құрылған. Екі стратегия қолданатын тіл үлгісін таңдау үшін, мысалы, алдыңғы тіл үлгісінен кейін қосымша кодер қабатын қосу үлгісін қолданатын тіл үлгісінен кейін таңдауға немесе қатынастық графикалық құрылғысын қатынастық қатынастың үші Біз тіл үлгісін алдын- ала оқыту үлгісінде таңдау мәліметінің түсінікті мәліметті ендіру керек дегенді көрсетедік.', 'ml': 'മാതൃപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളെ (PrLMs) പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനും പുതിയ പരിശോധന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിനും ഒരു കഠിനമായ പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട പദ്ധതിയുള്ള ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സിന്റാക്റ്റ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയെ പിന്തുടര്\u200dന്ന് ക്യൂറെഫിലെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ ഉത്തരം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളാനുള്ള പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഒരു മോഡലിന്റെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തെ പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പു മുന്\u200dപരിശീലന ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടി കൂടുതല്\u200d കോണ്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് മോഡലിനുശേഷം കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ പേരുകളിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയാ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് മുന്\u200dപ് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങ് സ്റ്റേജില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നത', 'ms': 'Pemahaman pembacaan mesin adalah bidang kajian dan ujian yang dipelajari dengan kuat untuk menilai model bahasa yang telah dilatih-dilatih (PrLMs) baru dan strategi penyesuaian, dan kajian baru-baru ini telah memperkaya model bahasa yang telah dilatih-dilatih dengan maklumat sintaktik, semantik dan bahasa lain untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Dalam kertas ini, kami meniru proses pembacaan manusia dalam menyambungkan ungkapan anaforik dan secara eksplicit menggunakan maklumat persamaan entiti untuk meningkatkan penyampilan perkataan dari model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih, untuk menentukan penyampilan penyampilan entiti yang mesti dikenalpasti untuk jawapan soalan yang menginsitif persamaan dalam QUOREF, - set data relatif baru yang direka secara khusus untuk menilai prestasi berkaitan dengan persamaan model. Kami menggunakan dua strategi untuk menyesuaikan model bahasa pra-dilatih, iaitu, meletakkan lapisan pengekod tambahan selepas model bahasa pra-dilatih untuk fokus pada sebutan koreferensi atau membina rangkaian konvolusi graf hubungan untuk model hubungan koreferensi. Kami menunjukkan bahawa penyambungan eksplicit maklumat persamaan dalam tahap penyesuaian baik berjalan lebih baik daripada penyambungan maklumat persamaan dalam praselatihan model bahasa.', 'mn': 'Машины уншлагын ойлголт бол шинэ урд сургалтын хэл загваруудыг (PrLMs) болон сайхан шийдвэрлэх стратегийг үнэлэх хэмжээний судалгаа, шалгалтын талбар юм. Саяхан судалгаагаар сургалтын урд сургалтын хэл загваруудыг синтактик, semantic болон бусад хэл загваруудын ажиллагааг са Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүний унших үйл явцыг Анафорик илэрхийллийг холбоход дүрслэж, хүмүүсийн тухай зөв мэдээллийг сургалтын өмнө сургалтын загвараас нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой болгодог. QUOREF-д зөв асуулт хариулах ёстой зүйлсийг тодорхойлдохын тулд Загварын холбоотой үйл ажиллагааг үнэлэхэд зориулагдсан харьцангуй шинэ өгөгдлийн сангууд. Бид хоёр стратегийг сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загварын тулд нэмэлт кодчуудын давхарыг сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загварын дараа анхаарлаа хандуулах эсвэл хамааралтай график холбоотой сүлжээг бүтээхэд ашигладаг. Бид хэл загварын өмнө сургалтын тусламжтай мэдээллийн тодорхой нэгтгэл нь хэлний загвараас илүү сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Forståking av maskinelesing er ein sterkt studiert forskning og testfeltet for å evaluera nye føretrainerte språk- modeller (PrLMs) og finnstillingsstrategiar, og siste studier har røyd dei føretrainerte språk- modelane med syntaktiske, semantiske og andre språk- informasjon for å forbedra utviklinga av modelane. I denne papiret imiterer vi den menneskelige lesingsprosessen ved å kopla til anaforiske uttrykk og uttrykk koreferansinformasjonen av einingar for å forbetra ordinnbygginga frå den først trengte språk-modellen, for å markere koreferansmenyen av einingar som må identifiserast for koreferanse-intensiv spørsmål som svarar i QUOREF, Eit relativt ny datasett som er spesifikke utforma for å evaluera utviklinga av eit modell med koreferanse. Vi bruker to strategier for å finne opp eit føretrained språk-modell, dvs. å plassera eit ekstra koderingslag etter eit føretrainert språk-modell for å fokusera på koreferansmenyen eller å konstruera eit relasjonell graf-konvolusjonell nettverk for å modellere koreferanslane. Vi demonstrerer at det eksplisitte inkluderinga av koreferansinformasjonen i finnstillingsstaden utfører bedre enn inkluderinga av koreferansinformasjonen i føreøving av eit språk-modell.', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie czytania maszynowego jest intensywnie zbadanym polem badawczym i testowym oceny nowych modeli językowych (PrLM) i strategii dostrajania, a ostatnie badania wzbogaciły wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe o informacje składniowe, semantyczne i inne językowe w celu poprawy wydajności modeli. W niniejszym artykule naśladujemy proces czytania człowieka w łączeniu wyrażeń anaforycznych i wyraźnie wykorzystujemy informacje o koreferencji podmiotów do ulepszenia osadzeń słowa z wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego, aby podkreślić wspomnienia o koreferencji podmiotów, które muszą być zidentyfikowane dla odpowiedzi na pytania intensywne w QUOREF, stosunkowo nowy zbiór danych, który jest specjalnie zaprojektowany do oceny wydajności modelu związanej z współdziałaniem. Używamy dwóch strategii do dostrojenia wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego, a mianowicie umieszczania dodatkowej warstwy kodera po wstępnie przeszkolonym modelu językowym, aby skupić się na wspomnieniach o współdzieleniu lub budowania sieci konwolucyjnej wykresu relacyjnego do modelowania relacji koreferencji. Wykazujemy, że wyraźne włączenie informacji o współpracy w etapie dostrajania sprawdza się lepiej niż włączenie informacji o współpracy w przedszkoleniu modelu językowego.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea mașinii de citit este un domeniu de cercetare și testare puternic studiat pentru evaluarea noilor modele lingvistice pre-instruite (PrLM) și strategii de reglare fină, iar studiile recente au îmbogățit modelele lingvistice pre-instruite cu informații sintactice, semantice și alte informații lingvistice pentru a îmbunătăți performanța modelelor. În această lucrare, imităm procesul de citire umană în conectarea expresiilor anaforice și valorificăm în mod explicit informațiile de corefență ale entităților pentru a îmbunătăți încorporarea cuvântului din modelul lingvistic pre-instruit, pentru a evidenția mențiunile de corefență ale entităților care trebuie identificate pentru răspunsul intensiv la întrebări în QUOREF, un set de date relativ nou, conceput special pentru a evalua performanța corefenței unui model. Folosim două strategii pentru a regla un model lingvistic pre-instruit, și anume, plasarea unui strat de codificator suplimentar după un model lingvistic pre-instruit pentru a se concentra pe mențiunile de corefență sau construirea unei rețele convoluționale de grafic relațional pentru a modela relațiile de corefență. Demonstrăm că încorporarea explicită a informațiilor de corefență în etapa de reglare fină performează mai bine decât încorporarea informațiilor de corefență în pregătirea unui model lingvistic.', 'sr': 'Razumijevanje pročitanja mašina je teško proučavano istraživanje i testovno polje za procjenu novih predobučenih jezičkih modela (PrLMs) i strategija za finaliziranje, a nedavna istraživanja su poboljšale predobučene jezičke modele sintaktičnim, semantičnim i drugim jezičkim informacijama kako bi poboljšali provedbu modela. U ovom papiru imitiramo proces ljudskog čitanja u povezivanju anaforskih izraza i isključivo uticajemo na informacije o pristojnosti entitata kako bi poboljšali reč uključene iz predobučenog jezičkog modela, kako bi naglasili pristojnost spomena entitata koje moraju biti identifikovane za odgovor na pristojno-intenzivno pitanje u QUOREF-u, relativno novi komplet podataka koji je posebno dizajniran za procjenu provedbe model a povezanih sa dobrodošlošću. Koristimo dve strategije kako bi sredili predobučeni jezički model, a to je postavljanje dodatnog kodera sloja nakon predobučenog jezičkog modela da se fokusiramo na spominjanje dobrodošlosti ili konstruiranje vezanog grafa konvolucionalne mreže za model odnosa sa dobrodošlicom. Pokazujemo da se pojasno uključivanje informacija o pristojnosti u pozornici ispravlja bolje od uključivanja informacija o pristojnosti u predobuku jezičkog model a.', 'so': "Qiimeynta koorsiga lagu akhriyo waa barashada iyo imtixaanka oo aad u adag in lagu qiimeeyo noocyada afka hore (PrLMs) iyo qorshaha hagitaan oo wanaagsan, waxbarashada ugu dambeysayna waxay hoydeen modellada afka hore oo la tababaray oo ku qoran muuqashada qoraalka qoraalka, sintactika, semantika iyo macluumaadka kale oo luuqadda ah si ay u hagaajiyaan tababarka modellada. Qoraalkan ayaannu isku daynaa baaritaanka akhrinta dadka si aan u xidhiidhinno hadalka caafimaadka ah iyo si cad u soo dirno macluumaadka waxyaabaha ay leeyihiin inay kordhisaan hadalka ka modelka afka hore oo la baray, si aan loo caddeeyo xubnaha macluumaadka ay u baahan tahay in loo caddeeyo su'aalaha aad ugu jawaabayo QUOREF,  a relatively new dataset that is specifically designed to evaluate the coreference-related performance of a model.  Waxaynu isticmaalnaa laba strategis si a an u sameynno model afka hore oo lagu tababaray, tusaale ahaan sawir dheeraad ah kadib qaab afka hore lagu baray kadib, si aan ugu fiirsano tilmaamaha qoyska ama aan u dhisno shabakadda xiriirka, si aan u sameyno xiriirka hore. Waxaynu muujinnaa in laguugu qabsashada macluumaadka kaalmada ee rugta caafimaadka ah uu sameeyaa mid ka wanaagsan in laguugu qoro macluumaadka kaalmada horumarinta tusaale ahaan luuqada.", 'sv': 'Maskinläsförståelse är ett tungt studerat forsknings- och testfält för utvärdering av nya förklädda språkmodeller (PrLM) och finjusteringsstrategier, och nyligen genomförda studier har berikat de förklädda språkmodellerna med syntaktisk, semantisk och annan språklig information för att förbättra modellernas prestanda. I denna uppsats imiterar vi den mänskliga läsprocessen i samband med anaforiska uttryck och utnyttjar uttryckligen coreferenceinformation av entiteterna för att förbättra ordinbäddningar från den förutbildade språkmodellen, för att belysa de coreferencomnämnanden av entiteter som måste identifieras för coreferenceintensiv frågesvar i QUOREF, en relativt ny datauppsättning som är särskilt utformad för att utvärdera en modells coreferencerelaterade prestanda. Vi använder oss av två strategier för att finjustera en färdigutbildad språkmodell, nämligen att placera ett ytterligare kodningslager efter en färdigutbildad språkmodell för att fokusera på coreferenzomnämningarna eller bygga ett relationsgraffkonvulutivt nätverk för att modellera corefeferensrelationerna. Vi visar att det uttryckliga införlivandet av coreferenceinformation i finjusteringsstadiet presterar bättre än införlivandet av coreferenceinformation i förberedande språkmodell.', 'si': 'මැෂින් කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාෂාව මොඩේල්ස් (PrLMs) සහ හ හොඳින් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා අලු මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මිනිස්සු කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනාෆෝරික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් භාෂා මොඩේල් වලින් වචනයක් විශ්වාස සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් අළුත් තොරතුරු සෙට් එකක් විශේෂයෙන් සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ මොඩේල් එකක් ගැන අනු අපි ප්\u200dරධානය දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා ප්\u200dරධානය කළ භාෂාවක් මොඩේලයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරධානය කරගන්න, ප්\u200dරධානය කළ භාෂාවක් මොඩේලයක් පස්සේ ප්\u200dරධානය කරගන අපි පැහැදිලි කරනවා කියලා හොඳ ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කලින් ප්\u200dරශ්න', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tal-qari bil-magni huwa qasam tar-riċerka u t-testijiet studjati sew għall-evalwazzjoni ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi ġodda mħarrġa minn qabel (PrLMs) u strateġiji ta’ rfinar, u studji reċenti arrikkixxew il-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel b’informazzjoni sintattika, semantika u lingwistika oħra biex itejbu l-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli. F’dan id-dokument, nimitaw il-proċess tal-qari mill-bniedem fil-konnessjoni tal-espressjonijiet anaforiċi u nagħmlu użu espliċitu mill-informazzjoni dwar il-koreferenza tal-entitajiet biex itejbu l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem mill-mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel, sabiex jenfasizzaw is-semmijiet tal-koreferenza tal-entitajiet li jridu jiġu identifikati għat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet intensivi fil-koreferenza fi QUOREF, • sett ta’ dejta relattivament ġdid li huwa ddisinjat speċifikament biex jevalwa l-prestazzjoni relatata mal-koreferenza ta’ mudell. We use two strategies to fine-tune a pre-trained language model, namely, placing an additional encoder layer after a pre-trained language model to focus on the coreference mentions or constructing a relational graph convolutional network to model the coreference relations.  Aħna nippruvaw li l-inkorporazzjoni espliċita tal-informazzjoni dwar il-koreferenza fl-istadju ta’ rfinar tagħmel a ħjar mill-inkorporazzjoni tal-informazzjoni dwar il-koreferenza fit-taħriġ ta’ qabel mudell lingwistiku.', 'ta': 'புதிய பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளையும் (PrLMs) மற்றும் நல்ல துண்டிக்கும் திட்டங்களையும் மதிப்பிடுவதற்கான புதிய மொழி மொழி மாதிரிகளையும் முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளையும் ஒத்திசைவாக,  இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் மனித வாசிப்பு செயல்பாட்டை பின்பற்றுகிறோம் மற்றும் வெளிப்படையாக பொருளின் கூற்று தகவலை இணைத்து முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரியிலிருந்து வார்த்தை அதிகப்படுத்துவதற்கு, முன்  ஒரு மாதிரியின் குறிப்பிட்ட புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை மதிப்பிடுவதற்காக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி முறைமையை நாம் இரண்டு திட்டங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், அதாவது, முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி பிறகு ஒரு கூடுதல் குறியீட்டு அடுக்கை  நாம் வெளிப்படையாக குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரியில் ஒரு மொழி மாதிரியில் குறிப்பிடும் தகவலை செயல்படுத்துவதை விட சிறந்ததாக செ', 'ur': 'ماشین پڑھنے کی سمجھ ایک سخت تحقیق اور آزمائش فیلڈ ہے کہ نو پیش تطابق کی زبان مدل (PrLMs) اور بہترین تطابق استراتژی کا ارزش کریں، اور اچھے تحقیقات نے سنتاکتی, سیمانٹیکی اور دوسری زبان شناسی معلومات کے ساتھ پیش تطابق کی زبان مدل کو بہترین کر دیا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم انسان کی پڑھنے کی پروسس کو نافوریک اثرات کے ساتھ پیدا کرنے کے لئے پیدا کرتے ہیں اور انٹیوں کی مہربانی معلومات کو صریح اثرات دیتے ہیں کہ کلمات کو پہلے تدریس کی زبان موڈل سے زیادہ تدریج کریں، تاکہ ان انٹیوں کی مہربانی کا ذکر کریں جو QUOREF میں مہربانی کے سوال کے لئے پہچان لیں، ایک نسبتا نئی ڈاٹ سٹ جو مخصوص طراحی کی گئی ہے ایک موڈل کے مطابق قابلیت کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم دو استراتژی استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کو مکمل کریں، یعنی ایک اضافہ اکڈر لائر کو ایک پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کے بعد مکمل کریں کہ اس کے ذریعہ مکمل یاد کریں یا ایک رابطہ گراف کنویلوٹ نیٹ ورک کو مکمل کریں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک زبان مدل کی آموزش سے پہلے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz anafotik ifodalarni bog'lash uchun inson o'quvchi jarayoni birlashtiramiz va birinchi o'rganilgan tillar modelidagi so'zlarni oshirish mumkin, va QUOREF'da javob berish kerak boʻlgan obʼektlarning qiymatini ko'rsatish mumkin,  a relatively new dataset that is specifically designed to evaluate the coreference-related performance of a model.  Biz birinchi taʼminlovchi tildan oldin foydalanuvchi ikkita strategiya ishlatamiz, birinchi taʼminlovchi tillar modelidagi qoʻshimcha kodlash darajasini qo'shish mumkin, birinchi taʼminlovchi tillar modelidagi foydalanish uchun qo'shimcha darajaga qo'shish mumkin yoki bir bog'liq grafik tarmoqni yaratish uchun bog'liq tarmoqni yaratish. Biz taqdimot holatida ma'lumotni ajratishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, birinchi o'rganishdan oldin tillar modelini o'rganishdan yaxshi ko'proq ma'lumotni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Kỹ năng đọc máy là một lĩnh vực nghiên cứu và thử nghiệm được nghiên cứu kỹ lưỡng để đánh giá các mô hình ngôn ngữ mới được đào tạo (PrLMs) và các chiến lược cải tạo kỹ lưỡng, và các nghiên cứu gần đây đã cung cấp các mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo đầy đủ bằng thông tin cấu trúc, ngữ pháp và ngôn ngữ khác để nâng cao khả năng của mô-đun. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giả mạo tiến trình đọc người để kết nối các biểu hiện ngoài da và dùng những thông tin kinh tế của các thực thể để tăng cường sự nhúng từ từ từ trong mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo, để nhấn mạnh những khả năng đề cập đến thực thể cần được xác định để trả lời trong QUROF, một bộ dữ liệu tương đối mới được thiết kế để đánh giá khả năng cao của mô hình. Chúng tôi dùng hai chiến lược để hiệu chỉnh một mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo trước, đó là đặt thêm một lớp mã hóa bổ sung sau một mô hình ngôn ngữ đã được đào tạo để tập trung vào khả năng đề cập hay thiết lập một mạng lưới liên quan phân khu để mô hình mối quan hệ. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc ghi rõ thông tin sốt hạn vào giai đoạn độ cẩn thận tốt hơn việc thêm thông tin sốt hạn vào mô hình ngôn ngữ trước khi đào tạo.', 'da': "Maskinlæseforståelse er et stærkt undersøgt forsknings- og testfelt til evaluering af nye prætrænede sprogmodeller (PrLM'er) og finjusterende strategier, og nyere undersøgelser har beriget de prætrænede sprogmodeller med syntaktisk, semantisk og anden sproglig information for at forbedre modellernes ydeevne. I denne artikel efterligner vi den menneskelige læseprocess i forbindelse med de anaforiske udtryk og udtrykkeligt udnytter coreferenceinformation af entiteterne til at forbedre ordet embeddings fra den præ-trænede sprogmodel, for at fremhæve coreference omtaler af de entiteter, der skal identificeres for coreferenceintensive spørgsmål besvarelse i QUOREF, et relativt nyt datasæt, der er specielt designet til at evaluere en models coreferencerelaterede ydeevne. Vi bruger to strategier til at finjustere en præ-trænet sprogmodel, nemlig at placere et ekstra encoder lag efter en præ-trænet sprogmodel til at fokusere på coreference omtaler eller konstruere et relationsgraf konvulutivt netværk til at modellere coreference relationerne. Vi påviser, at den eksplicitte indarbejdelse af coreferenceinformation i finjusteringsfasen fungerer bedre end indarbejdelsen af coreferenceinformation i forberedelsen af en sprogmodel.", 'bg': 'Разбирането на машинното четене е силно изучена изследователска и тестова област за оценка на нови предварително обучени езикови модели (ПРМ) и стратегии за фина настройка, а последните проучвания обогатиха предварително обучените езикови модели със синтактична, семантична и друга лингвистична информация за подобряване на ефективността на моделите. В настоящата статия имитираме процеса на човешко четене при свързване на анафоричните изрази и изрично използваме информацията за кореференцията на субектите, за да подобрим вграждането на думата от предварително обучения езиков модел, с цел да подчертаем кореференцията на субектите, които трябва да бъдат идентифицирани за кореференция-интензивен отговор на въпроси в КУОРЕФ, относително нов набор от данни, който е специално проектиран за оценка на показателите, свързани с съвместната референция, на даден модел. Използваме две стратегии за фино настройване на предварително обучен езиков модел, а именно поставяне на допълнителен кодер слой след предварително обучен езиков модел, за да се фокусираме върху споменаването на кореференцията или изграждане на релационна графика конвелуционна мрежа за моделиране на кореференциалните отношения. Доказваме, че изричното включване на информация за кореференция в етапа на фина настройка се представя по-добре от включването на информацията за кореференция в предобучение на езиков модел.', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje pročitanja strojeva je teško ispitivano istraživanje i testovno polje za procjenu novih predobučenih jezičkih modela (PrLMs) i strategija za finaliziranje, a nedavna ispitivanja povećala su predobučene jezičke modele sa sintaktičnim, semantičnim i drugim jezičkim informacijama kako bi poboljšala učinkovitost modela. U ovom papiru imitiramo proces ljudskog čitanja u povezivanju anaforskih izraza i isključivo utiču na informacije o pristojnosti subjekta kako bi poboljšali riječ uključene iz predobučenog jezičkog modela, kako bi naglasili pristojnost spominjanja subjekta koje moraju biti identificirane za odgovor na odgovor na korisno-intenzivno pitanje u QUOREF-u, relativno novi komplet podataka koji je posebno dizajniran za procjenu učinka model a povezanih s dobrodošlošću. Koristimo dvije strategije kako bi se ispravili predobučeni jezički model, a to je postavljanje dodatnog kodera sloja nakon predobučenog jezičkog modela, kako bi se usredotočili na spominjanje dobrodošlosti ili konstruiranje veznih grafa konvolucionalne mreže za modelu odnosa dobrodošlosti. Mi pokazujemo da pojasno uključenje informacija o dobrotvornoj mjeri u fazi ispravnosti bolje čini nego uključenje informacija o dobrotvornoj mjeri u predobuku jezičkog model a.', 'nl': "Begrijpen van machine reading is een intensief bestudeerd onderzoeks- en testveld voor het evalueren van nieuwe voorgetrainde taalmodellen (PrLM's) en fine-tuning strategieën, en recente studies hebben de voorgetrainde taalmodellen verrijkt met syntactische, semantische en andere taalkundige informatie om de prestaties van de modellen te verbeteren. In dit artikel imiteren we het menselijke leesproces bij het verbinden van de anaforische uitdrukkingen en gebruiken we expliciet de coreference-informatie van de entiteiten om de woordembeddingen uit het voorgetrainde taalmodel te verbeteren, om de coreference-vermeldingen van de entiteiten te benadrukken die moeten worden geïdentificeerd voor coreference-intensieve vragen beantwoorden in QUOREF, een relatief nieuwe dataset die specifiek is ontworpen om de coreferentie-gerelateerde prestaties van een model te evalueren. We gebruiken twee strategieën om een voorgetraind taalmodel af te stemmen, namelijk het plaatsen van een extra encoderlaag na een voorgetraind taalmodel om te focussen op de coreferentie vermeldingen of het bouwen van een relationeel grafiekconvolutioneel netwerk om de coreferentie relaties te modelleren. We tonen aan dat de expliciete integratie van coreference informatie in de fine-tuning fase beter presteert dan de integratie van coreference informatie in de pre-training van een taalmodel.", 'id': 'Pemahaman pembacaan mesin adalah bidang penelitian dan ujian yang dipelajari dengan kuat untuk mengevaluasi model bahasa yang terlatih (PrLMs) dan strategi penyesuaian baru, dan penelitian baru-baru ini telah memperkaya model bahasa yang terlatih dengan informasi sintaktik, semantis dan bahasa lainnya untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Dalam kertas ini, kami meniru proses pembacaan manusia dalam menghubungkan ekspresi anafora dan secara eksplicit menggunakan informasi koreferensi dari entitas untuk meningkatkan penyampilan kata dari model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih, untuk menyatakan keterangan dari entitas yang harus diidentifikasi untuk menjawab pertanyaan yang intensif koreferensi di QUOREF, - sebuah set data relatif baru yang secara khusus dirancang untuk mengevaluasi prestasi berkaitan dengan koreferensi model. Kami menggunakan dua strategi untuk memperbaiki model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya, yaitu, menempatkan lapisan pengekode tambahan setelah model bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya untuk fokus pada sebutan koreferensi atau membangun jaringan konvolusi grafik relatif untuk model hubungan koreferensi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa inkorporasi eksplicit dari informasi koreferensi di tahap penyesuaian lebih baik daripada inkorporasi informasi koreferensi di pre-pelatihan model bahasa.', 'de': 'Das maschinelle Leseverstehen ist ein intensiv erforschtes Forschungs- und Testfeld zur Evaluierung neuer vortrainierter Sprachmodelle (PrLMs) und Feinabstimmungsstrategien. Neuere Studien haben die vortrainierten Sprachmodelle mit syntaktischen, semantischen und anderen linguistischen Informationen angereichert, um die Leistung der Modelle zu verbessern. In diesem Beitrag imitieren wir den menschlichen Leseprozess bei der Verknüpfung der anaphorischen Ausdrücke und nutzen explizit die Coreferenz-Informationen der Entitäten, um die Worteinbettungen aus dem vortrainierten Sprachmodell zu verbessern, um die Coreferenz-Erwähnungen der Entitäten hervorzuheben, die für die coreferenzintensive Fragebeantwortung in QUOREF identifiziert werden müssen. Ein relativ neuer Datensatz, der speziell entwickelt wurde, um die Coreferenz-bezogene Leistung eines Modells zu bewerten. Wir verwenden zwei Strategien, um ein vortrainiertes Sprachmodell zu verfeinern, nämlich das Platzieren einer zusätzlichen Encoder-Schicht nach einem vortrainierten Sprachmodell, um sich auf die Coreferenz-Erwähnungen zu konzentrieren, oder das Erstellen eines relationalen Graphen-Faltungsnetzwerks, um die Coreferenz-Beziehungen zu modellieren. Wir zeigen, dass die explizite Einbeziehung von Coreferenz-Informationen in die Feinabstimmung-Phase besser funktioniert als die Einbeziehung der Coreferenz-Informationen in die Vorausbildung eines Sprachmodells.', 'fa': 'درک خواندن ماشین یک محل تحقیقات و آزمایش زیادی برای ارزیابی مدل های پیش آموزش زبان جدید و استراتژی های خوب تنظیم است، و تحقیقات اخیر مدل های پیش آموزش زبان را با اطلاعات سنتاکتیک، سیمانتیک و دیگر زبان\u200cشناسی برای تحقیقات مدل\u200cها بهبود داده\u200cاند. در این کاغذ، ما فرآیند خواندن انسان را در ارتباط با توجه به توجه به توجه به توجه با توجه به اطلاعات احتیاط از شرکت ها برای افزایش کردن کلمه وارد شدن از مدل زبان پیش آموزش می کنیم، تا یادآوری احتیاط از شرکت هایی که باید برای پاسخ دادن سوال مضبوط و مضبوط در QUOREF شناسایی شود، تأثیر دهیم، یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای نسبتا جدید که به طور خاص طراحی شده برای ارزیابی عملکرد مربوط به یک مدل است. ما از دو استراتژی استفاده می کنیم تا یک مدل پیش آموزش زبان را درست کنیم، که یعنی، یک لایه رمز\u200cکننده اضافه را پس از یک مدل پیش آموزش زبان برای تمرکز روی یادآوری\u200cهای رضایت یا ساختن شبکه رابطه\u200cای رابطه\u200cای رابطه\u200cهای رضایت را مدل کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که شامل مشخص اطلاعات رضایت در مرحله اصلاح کردن بهتر از شامل اطلاعات رضایت در پیش آموزش یک مدل زبان انجام می دهد.', 'ko': '기계독해는 새로운 예훈련 언어모델(PrLMs)과 마이크로스피드 전략을 평가하기 위해 주목받는 연구와 테스트 분야로, 최근의 연구는 문법, 의미와 다른 언어 정보를 활용해 예훈련 언어모델을 풍부하게 만들어 모델의 성능을 향상시켰다.본고에서 우리는 반지 표현을 연결할 때 인류의 읽기 과정을 모의하고 실체의 공지 정보를 명확하게 이용하여 미리 훈련된 언어 모델에 있는 단어의 삽입을 강화하여QUOREF에서 반드시 식별해야 하는 실체의 공지 언급을 돋보이게 함으로써 공지 집약형 문제 답변을 한다.비교적 새로운 데이터 집합으로 모델의 공통된 관련 성능을 평가하는 데 전문적으로 설계되었다.우리는 두 가지 전략을 사용하여 미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 미세하게 조정한다. 즉, 미리 훈련된 언어 모델 다음에 추가 인코더층을 설치하여 관련 인용을 주목하거나 관계도 볼륨 네트워크를 구축하여 관련 인용 관계를 구축한다.우리는 마이크로 조정 단계에서 현식 합병 공지 정보가 언어 모델의 예비 훈련 단계에서 합병 공지 정보보다 더 잘 나타난다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa kusoma mashine ni utafiti uliomfunzwa vigumu na uwanja wa jaribio kwa kutathmini mbinu mpya za lugha zilizofunzwa kabla (PrLMs) na mikakati ya mafunzo mazuri, na tafiti za hivi karibuni zimekuwa zikitajirisha modeli za lugha zilizofundishwa kabla kwa ushirikiano, semantiki na taarifa nyingine za lugha ili kuboresha utendaji wa mifano. Katika karatasi hii, tunafuatilia mchakato wa kusoma binadamu katika kuunganisha hisia za utaalamu na kwa uwazi kutumia taarifa muhimu za vyombo vya habari ili kuongeza ujumbe wa maneno kutoka kwenye mtindo wa lugha iliyoendelewa kabla, ili kuonyesha maarifa ya vifaa vinavyotakiwa kutambuliwa kwa maswali makubwa yanayojibu nchini QUOREF, • seti mpya ya taarifa ambazo imelengwa kwa ajili ya kutathmini utendaji wa muundo unaohusiana na msingi. Tunatumia mikakati miwili ya kuboresha mifano ya lugha ya awali, yaani, kuweka kiwango cha kuongezeka zaidi baada ya mifano ya lugha iliyoendelea kabla ya kutangaza tahadhari au kujenga mtandao wa ushirikiano mkubwa wa mtandaoni ili kuonyesha mahusiano ya msingi. Tunaonyesha kuwa mujumuishaji wa taarifa za makampuni katika jukwaa hili la mafunzo vizuri unafanya vizuri kuliko kuungizwa kwa taarifa za mafunzo ya awali katika mtindo wa lugha.', 'tr': "Maşynyň okamaky düşünmesi täze öň-bilinmeli dil nusgalaryny (PrLMs) we gowy düzenleme stratejikleri ýüze çykmak üçin agyr ullanýan araştyrmalar we testi alandyr. Soňky araştyrmalar öň-bilinmeli dil nusgalaryny syntaktik, semantik we başga dil maglumatlaryny bejermek üçin duýdurdyrlar. Bu kagyzda, adamlaryň okamak prosesini anaforik ifadeleri baglaşdyrmak üçin bejermek üçin we bu hekaýda QUOREF'de ýok soragy üçin tanyş edilmeli guramlaryň seçeneklerini bejermek üçin janlaşdyrýarys. Diňe bir nusga görä çykyş etmek üçin düzenlenen täze bir datasetir. Biz öňündeki dil nusgasyny bejermek üçin iki strategiýany ulanýarys. Diýmek isleýän dillerden öňündeki bir ködleme nusgasyna fokus etmek üçin, ýada nähili görnüş tertiblemek üçin bir grafik taýýarlamak üçin golaý düzümlerni düzenlemek üçin. Biz düzgün düzgün taýýarlama sahypasynda nähili taýýarlama maglumatyň daşary dil nusgasyny öňünden daşary etmekden has gowy bolandygyny görkeýäris.", 'af': "Masjien lees verstaan is 'n swaar studieerde forsoek en toets veld vir die evaluering van nuwe voorafgevorderde taal modele (PrLMs) en fyn-tuning strategies, en onlangse studie het die voorafgevorderde taal modele met sintaktika, semantiese en ander lingvisiese inligting vergroot om die prestasie van die modele te verbeter. In hierdie papier imiteer ons die menslike lees proses in die verbinding van die anaforiese uitdrukkings en uitduidelik die koreferensieinligting van die entiteite om die woord inbettings van die voorafgeleerde taal model te verbeter, om die koreferensiespesifisering van die entiteite te verlig wat moet geïdentifiseer word vir koreferensieintensiewe vraag antwoord in QUOREF, 'n Relatiewe nuwe datastel wat spesifieke ontwerp is om die voorwerp-verwante prestasie van 'n model te evalueer. Ons gebruik twee strategies om 'n voorafgevorderde taal model te fin-tuneer, bedoel 'n addisionele koder laag na' n voorafgevorderde taal model te plaas om fokus te maak op die voorafgevordering mentionere of 'n relasionele graaf konvolusionele netwerk te konstrukteer na model van die voorafgevorderingsrelasies. Ons wys dat die eksplisiese inkorporering van koreferensieinligting in die fyn-tuning stadium beter uitvoer as die inkorporering van die koreferensieinligting in 'n taal model voor-oefening.", 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i leximit të makinave është një fushë kërkimi dhe testimi shumë studiuar për vlerësimin e modeleve të reja të gjuhës së paratrajnuar (PrLMs) dhe strategjive të përshtatshme dhe studimet e fundit kanë pasuruar modelet e gjuhës së paratrajnuar me informacion sintaktik, semantik dhe gjuhësor të tjera për të përmirësuar performancën e modeleve. Në këtë letër, imitojmë procesin e leximit njerëzor në lidhjen e shprehjeve anaforike dhe nxjerrim në mënyrë eksplicite informacionin e korreferencës të njësive për të përmirësuar përfshirjen e fjalëve nga modeli i gjuhës së paratrajnuar, me qëllim që të theksojmë përmendimet e korreferencës të njësive që duhet të identifikohen për përgjigjen e pyetjeve të intensifikuara me koreferencë në QUOREF, - një grup relativisht të ri të dhënash që është projektuar specifikisht për të vlerësuar performancën lidhur me korreferencën e një modeli. Ne përdorim dy strategji për të përshtatur një model gjuhësh të paratrajnuar, veçan ërisht, vendosjen e një shtrese koduese shtesë pas një modeli gjuhësh të paratrajnuar për të përqëndruar në përmendimet e korreferencës ose ndërtimin e një rrjeti lidhur me grafikun konvolutiv për të modeluar marrëdhëniet e korreferencës. Ne demonstrojmë se përfshirja eksplicite e informacionit të korreferencës në fazën e rregullimit funksionon më mirë se përfshirja e informacionit të korreferencës në paratrajnimin e një modeli gjuhësh.', 'hy': 'Մեքենային կարդալու ընկալումը շատ ուսումնասիրել է հետազոտություններ և փորձարկումներ նոր նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների (PRLM) և փորձարկման ռազմավարությունների գնահատելու համար, և վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները հարստացրել են նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները սինտակտիկ, սեմանտիկ և այլ լեզվաբանական ինֆորմա Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կրկնօրինակում ենք մարդկային կարդալու գործընթացը անաֆորական արտահայտությունների միավորման մեջ և բացահայտորեն օգտագործում ենք կազմակերպությունների համատեղյակ տեղեկատվությունը, որպեսզի - համեմատաբար նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը մասնավորապես նախագծված է մոդելի հարաբերակցության արդյունքների գնահատման համար: Մենք օգտագործում ենք երկու ստրատեգիաներ նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի ձևափոխելու համար, հատկապես, նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի հետևից ավելին կոդերի շերտ տեղադրելու, որպեսզի կենտրոնանանք կորեֆերանսի նշանների վրա կամ կառուցենք հարաբերական գծագրի հակառակցող ցանց,  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ կորֆերենսի ինֆորմացիայի բացատրական ներառումը բարելավման փուլում ավելի լավ է աշխատում, քան կորֆերենսի ինֆորմացիայի ներառումը լեզվի մոդելի նախապատրաստման մեջ:', 'am': 'የመኪን መቃውሚያ መፍትርት እና መፈተኛ መሬት አዲስ በፊት ተማሪ የቋንቋ ሞዴል (PrLMs) እና የመልካም ስርዓት ማረጋገጫ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የሰው አካባቢ ፕሮጀክትን በመጠቀም እና የአካላትን አካባቢ መረጃዎች ከቀድሞ ተማሪ ቋንቋ ሞዴል ቃልን እንዲያበጅል እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በኩል አዲስ የዳታ ማተሚያ በተለየ የኮርፌንስ-related የሞዴል አድራጊውን ለማስተካከል የተፈጠረ ነው፡፡ ሁለትን ተቃውሞ ለመጠቀም ለፊተኛ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ለመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፣ የኮርፌንስ ግንኙነትን ለማሳመር ወይም የግንኙነት ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ የሚጨማሪ የፊደል የፊደል የቋንቋ ምሳሌ አካባቢ ደረጃን ለመዘጋጀት እናደርጋለን፡፡ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'az': "Makinelərin oxunması yeni öyrənmiş dil modellərini (PrLMs) və düzgün düzgün düzgün düzgün təhsil etmək üçün a ğır təhsil edilmiş araştırma və sınama sahəsidir. Sonrakı təhsil modellərini sintaktik, semantik və başqa dil məlumatlarını düzəltmək üçün öyrənmişdir. Bu kağızda, insanların oxunması prosesini anaforik ifadələrini bağlamaq və QUOREF'də qarşılıq-ağır sual cavab vermək üçün tanıtmaq üçün təhsil edilən məlumatların məlumatlarını artırmaq üçün təhsil etdik. Bir modelinin müəyyən edilməsi üçün müəyyən edilən yeni verilən qurğu. Biz əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelini düzəltmək üçün iki strateji istifadə edirik, bu deyil ki, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelinin ardınca çox kodlayıcı sütunu yerləşdirmək və ya mərhəmətli ilişkilərin modelini məqsədilə bağlantılı grafik konvolucional şəklə inşa etmək üçün. Biz göstəririk ki, dil model in in əvvəlcə təhsil etməsində mərhəmət məlumatının a çıq-aydın istifadə edilməsi daha yaxşıdır.", 'bn': 'নতুন প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল (পিআরএলএমএস) এবং সুন্দর প্রশিক্ষিত কৌশলের মাধ্যমে মেশিনের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ গবেষণা এবং পরীক্ষা ক্ষেত্র। সম্প্রতি প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল সমৃদ্ধ করেছে সিন্ট্যাক্ট এই কাগজটিতে আমরা মানুষের পাঠের প্রক্রিয়াকে অনুসরণ করি বিভিন্ন প্রকাশের সাথে সংযুক্ত করে এবং স্পষ্ট ভাষা মডেল থেকে প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মোডেল থেকে শব্দ বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করার জন্য বিষয়গুলোর উল্লেখ করার জন্য একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট, যা বিশেষ করে একটি মডেলের কোরিফেন্স-সম্পর্কিত প্রভাব মূল্যায়নের জন্য নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে। আমরা দুটি কৌশল ব্যবহার করি পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের জন্য, যার মাধ্যমে একটি প্রশিক্ষণিত ভাষার মডেলের পর একটি অতিরিক্ত কোডার স্তর নির্ধারণ করার জন্য, কোরেফেন্সের সম্পর্ক মডেল করার আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ভাষার প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য অন্তর্ভুক্ত করার চেয়ে ভালো কোরেফেন্স তথ্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে।', 'ca': "La comprensió de la lectura màquina és un camp d'investigació i de prova molt estudiat per avaluar nous models de llenguatge pré-entrenats (PrLMs) i estratègies d'ajustament, i estudis recents han enriquegut els models de llenguatge pré-entrenats amb informació sinàctica, semàntica i altres informacions lingüístices per millorar el rendiment dels models. En aquest article imitem el procés de lectura humana en connectar les expressions anafòriques i aprofitem explícitament la informació de coreferència de les entitats per millorar les integracions de paraules del model de llenguatge pré-entrenat, per destacar les mencions de coreferència de les entitats que han de ser identificades per respondre a preguntes intensives en coreferència a QUOREF, un conjunt de dades relativament nou dissenyat específicament per avaluar el rendiment relacionat amb la coreferença d'un model. We use two strategies to fine-tune a pre-trained language model, namely, placing an additional encoder layer after a pre-trained language model to focus on the coreference mentions or constructing a relational graph convolutional network to model the coreference relations.  Demonstrem que l'incorporació explícita de la informació de coreferència a l'etapa d'ajustament funciona millor que l'incorporació de la informació de coreferència a un model de llenguatge.", 'bs': 'Razumijevanje pročitanja strojeva je teško proučavano istraživanje i testovno polje za procjenu novih predobučenih jezičkih modela (PrLMs) i strategija za finaliziranje, a nedavna istraživanja su bogatila predobučene jezičke modele sa sintaktičnim, semantičnim i drugim jezičkim informacijama kako bi poboljšala učinkovitost modela. U ovom papiru imitiramo proces ljudskog čitanja u povezivanju anaforskih izraza i isključivo uticajemo na informacije o pristojnosti subjekta kako bi poboljšali reč uključene iz predobučenog jezičkog modela, kako bi naglasili pristojnost spomenuti subjekta koje moraju biti identificirane za odgovor na pristojno-intenzivno pitanje u QUOREF-u, relativno novi komplet podataka koji je posebno dizajniran za procjenu učinka model a povezanih sa dobrodošlošću. Koristimo dvije strategije da se ispravimo predobučeni jezički model, a to je postavljanje dodatnog kodera sloja nakon predobučenog jezičkog modela, kako bi se fokusirali na spominjanje dobrodošlosti ili konstruiranje povezanih grafa konvolucionalnih mreža za modelu odnosa dobrodošlice. Pokazujemo da se pojasno uključivanje informacija o dobrotvornoj mjeri u fazi dobrotvorne mjere bolje čini nego uključivanje informacija o dobrotvornoj mjeri u predobuku jezičkog model a.', 'cs': 'Porozumění strojovému čtení je intenzivně studovaným výzkumným a zkušebním oborem pro hodnocení nových předškolených jazykových modelů (PrLM) a jemných strategií. Nedávné studie obohatily předškolené jazykové modely o syntaktické, sémantické a další jazykové informace pro zlepšení výkonnosti modelů. V tomto článku napodobujeme proces čtení lidí při propojování anaforických výrazů a explicitně využíváme informace o koreferenci entit ke zlepšení vkládání slov z předškoleného jazykového modelu, abychom zdůraznili zmínky o koreferenci entit, které musí být identifikovány pro koreferenci intenzivních otázek v QUOREF, relativně nový datový soubor, který je speciálně navržen pro hodnocení výkonnosti modelu souvisejícího s koreferencí. Používáme dvě strategie pro jemné ladění předtrénovaného jazykového modelu, a to umístění další kódovací vrstvy za předtrénovaný jazykový model, aby se zaměřilo na zmínky o koreferenci, nebo sestavení relační grafové konvoluční sítě pro modelování koreferenčních vztahů. Dokazujeme, že explicitní začlenění koreferenčních informací do fáze jemného ladění vede lépe než začlenění koreferenčních informací do předškolení jazykového modelu.', 'et': 'Masinlugemise mõistmine on tugevalt uuritud uurimis- ja testivaldkond uute eelõpetatud keelemudelite ja peenhäälestusstrateegiate hindamiseks ning hiljutised uuringud on rikastanud eelõpetatud keelemudeleid süntaktilise, semantilise ja muu keelelise teabega, et parandada mudelite jõudlust. Käesolevas töös imiteerime inimlikku lugemisprotsessi anafoorsete väljendite ühendamisel ja kasutame selgesõnaliselt üksuste sõnalist teavet, et parandada sõnalist manustamist eelõpetatud keelemudelist, et rõhutada üksuste sõnalist viidet, mida tuleb identifitseerida QUOREFis sõnaliselt intensiivseks küsimustele vastamiseks, suhteliselt uus andmekogum, mis on spetsiaalselt välja töötatud mudeli kaasviidetega seotud tulemuslikkuse hindamiseks. Kasutame kahte strateegiat eelõpetatud keelemudeli täpsustamiseks, nimelt täiendava kodeerija kihi paigutamiseks pärast eelõpetatud keelemudelit, et keskenduda koreferentsusele, või relatsioonigraafilise konvolutsioonivõrgu ehitamiseks koreferentsussuhete modelleerimiseks. Näitame, et koreferentsiinfo selgesõnaline lisamine peenhäälestuse etapis toimib paremini kui koreferentsiinfo lisamine keelemudeli eelõppesse.', 'fi': 'Konelukemisen ymmärtäminen on voimakkaasti tutkittu tutkimus- ja testiala uusien esikoulutettujen kielimallien (PrLM) ja hienosäätöstrategioiden arvioimiseksi, ja viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat rikastuttaneet esikoulutettuja kielimalleja syntaktisella, semanttisella ja muulla kielellisellä tiedolla mallien suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Tässä artikkelissa matkimme ihmisen lukuprosessia anaforisten ilmaisujen yhdistämisessä ja hyödynnämme yksiselitteisesti entiteettien koreferenssitietoja parantaaksemme sanaupotuksia esikoulutetusta kielimallista korostaaksemme koreferenssimainintoja entiteeteistä, jotka on tunnistettava koreferenssiintensiivistä vastausta varten QUOREFissa, suhteellisen uusi aineisto, joka on erityisesti suunniteltu arvioimaan mallin koreferenssiin liittyvää suorituskykyä. Käytämme kahta strategiaa esikoulutetun kielimallin hienosäätöön, nimittäin lisäkooderikerroksen sijoittamiseen esikoulutetun kielimallin jälkeen keskittymään koreferenssimainintoihin tai relaatiograafisen konvolutionaalisen verkoston rakentamiseen koreferenssisuhteiden mallintamiseen. Osoitamme, että koreferenssiinformaation selkeä sisällyttäminen hienosäätövaiheeseen suoriutuu paremmin kuin koreferenssiinformaation sisällyttäminen kielimallin esikoulutukseen.', 'jv': 'Mobil sing dipunangé perusahaan bungan kelas-kelas lan ujian banjur nggawe bener tentang kanggo kuwi model sing luwih banter, ingkang prarampun (PriLM) lan kelas-tuning policy sing apik, lan akeh mbuluwih dumaten sing ngendalikne kuwi model sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanepe nggawe winih antar-cara nggawe winih, semanti karo informasi oleh dumateng kuwi model. Nang pepul iki, kéné imiteré perusahaan anyar tentang karo pawaran anaphor lan nganggep nggawe informasi corefecture karo ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé, iso nglanggar kelangan langkung model sing dipunangé awak dhéwé, mengko iso nglanggar efecture dipunangé awak dhéwé karo ingkang surat sing kudu kedaulatan surat sing isin corefecture nggantiné karo pêrbe-aké string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem durung kanggo nambah akeh-ingkang model sing wis luwih dumaten, ngono nggawe koder diangkat dhéwé, dadine kapan sistem sing wis dipunarané kanggo ingkang dipunaraning nggawe gerangkat oleh dumaten Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno karo nggawe informasi dianggap karo coreferaken sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi tindakan nggawe informasi coreferaken karo model sing usul têbanjuré.', 'sk': 'Razumevanje strojnega branja je močno preučeno raziskovalno in testno področje za ocenjevanje novih vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov (PrLM) in strategij finega uravnavanja, nedavne študije pa so predhodno usposobljene jezikovne modele obogatile s sintaktičnimi, semantičnimi in drugimi jezikovnimi informacijami za izboljšanje učinkovitosti modelov. V prispevku posnemamo proces človeškega branja pri povezovanju anaforičnih izrazov in eksplicitno izkoristimo informacije o koreferenci entitet, da bi izboljšali vgradnjo besed iz vnaprej usposobljenega jezikovnega modela, da bi poudarili koreferenčne omembe entitet, ki jih je treba identificirati za koreferenčno intenzivno odgovarjanje na vprašanja v QUOREF, relativno nov nabor podatkov, ki je posebej zasnovan za ocenjevanje učinkovitosti modela, povezanega s srednjo referenco. Uporabljamo dve strategiji za natančno nastavitev vnaprej usposobljenega jezikovnega modela, in sicer postavitev dodatne plasti kodirja za vnaprej usposobljenim jezikovnim modelom, da se osredotočimo na omembe koreference ali gradnjo konvolucijske mreže relacijskih grafov za modeliranje koreferenčnih relacij. Pokazali smo, da je eksplicitna vključitev informacij o koreferenci v fazo finega uravnavanja boljša od vključitve informacij o koreferenci v predusposabljanje jezikovnega modela.', 'ha': "Kifin karatun karatun karatun karatun shi ne wani fili mai karatun littafi da jarraba cikin littafi mai nau'i dõmin an evaluate sauran misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman-wahalar (PrLM) da kuma masu tsari mai kyau, kuma masu ƙarami, sun rikitar da misalin harshen da aka yi wa zaman-haƙƙin ta da suntactic, semantic da wasu littafin linguistic dõmin ya kyautata aikin misãlai. Daga wannan takardan, Munã biyar jarrabin karatun mutane da za'a haɗa maganar faniki na fassarar fanikin mutum kuma Mu wajabta bayani ga ma'anaikin maɓalli dõmin a ƙara maganar da ke fitarwa daga misalin harshen da aka yi wa zaman-wa-haƙƙin, dõmin a nuna rabon masu tsari na abubuwa da za'a iya gane su da tambayi mai inganci da za'a karɓa a QUOREF, dictionary variant Tuna yi amfani da aikin gayi biyu zuwa ka sami wata misalin harshen da aka yi wa fara-tun, kamar, ka sami wata daraja mai ƙaranci daban da wata misalin harshen ta zaman-tsari dõmin ka yi zura kan karatun-sunan mafarinsa ko kuma mu sami wata shawara mai haɗi na grafyuta don ka sami danganta danganta na korrference. Tuna nũna cewa, shirin shirin bayani na haɗi ma'auni a cikin juyi mai baƙata, yana mafi alhẽri daga a shigar da ma'anar mutane cikin misalin harshe na farko.", 'bo': 'Machine reading comprehension is a heavily-studied research and test field for evaluating new pre-trained language models (PrLMs) and fine-tuning strategies, and recent studies have enriched the pre-trained language models with syntactic, semantic and other linguistic information to improve the performance of the models. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་སྦྱོར དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པར་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གཟུགས་རིས། We use two strategies to fine-tune a pre-trained language model, namely, placing an additional encoder layer after a pre-trained language model to focus on the coreferences mentions or constructing a relational graph convolutional network to model the coreference relations. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ནང་དུ་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དམིགས', 'he': 'Machine reading comprehension is a heavily-studied research and test field for evaluating new pre-trained language models (PrLMs) and fine-tuning strategies, and recent studies have enriched the pre-trained language models with syntactic, semantic and other linguistic information to improve the performance of the models.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מחמיטים את תהליך הקריאה האנושי בקשר לבטאות האנופוריות ולהשתמש באופן מוזר במידע הקודם של היחידות כדי לשפר את המילים הקודמות ממודל השפה המאמן מראש, כדי להדגיש את הזכרות הקודמות של היחידות שעליהן לזהות עבור שאלות אינטנסיביות לקודמות קבוצת נתונים חדשה יחסית שמתכננת במיוחד כדי להעריך את ההופעה הקשורה למודל. אנו משתמשים בשני אסטרטגיות כדי לתאים מודל שפה מאומן מראש, ובמיוחד, לשים שכבת קודד נוספת לאחר מודל שפה מאומן מראש כדי להתמקד על הזכרונות הקודמים אנו מוכיחים שהשילוב הירוק של מידע התאמה בשלב התאמה מתאים טוב יותר מהשילוב של מידע התאמה בתאמה מראש מודל שפה.'}
{'en': 'Pre-training to Match for Unified Low-shot Relation Extraction', 'fr': "WatClaimCheck\xa0: un nouvel ensemble de données pour l'implication et l'inférence des réclamations", 'ar': 'WatClaimCheck: مجموعة بيانات جديدة لاستحقاق المطالبة والاستدلال', 'es': 'WatClaimCheck: un nuevo conjunto de datos para la implicación e inferencia de reclamos', 'pt': 'WatClaimCheck: um novo conjunto de dados para vinculação e inferência de reivindicações', 'ja': 'WatClaimCheck:クレームのエンテイメントと推論のための新しいデータセット', 'hi': 'WatClaimCheck: दावा आवश्यकता और अनुमान के लिए एक नया डेटासेट', 'zh': 'WatClaimCheck:索赔蕴涵理新数集', 'ru': 'WatClaimCheck: Новый набор данных для утверждения и вывода', 'ga': 'WatClaimCheck: Tacar Sonraí nua le haghaidh Éileamh agus Tátail', 'el': 'Ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων για τον εμπλουτισμό και το συμπέρασμα αξιώσεων', 'hu': 'WatClaimCheck: Új adatkészlet a követelések kezeléséhez és fertőzéséhez', 'ka': 'Comment', 'it': "WatClaimCheck: un nuovo set di dati per l'integrazione e l'inferenza dei reclami", 'lt': 'WatClaimCheck: naujas reikalavimų pažeidimo ir pažeidimo duomenų rinkinys', 'mk': 'WatClaimCheck: Нов датотек за заштита и инференција на барањата', 'kk': 'WatClaimCheck: A new database for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'ms': 'WatClaimCheck: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'ml': 'വാട്ട് ക്ലായംപരിശോധിക്കുക: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'mt': 'WatClaimCheck: Sett ta’ Dejta ġdid għall-Intrapriża u l-Inferenza tat-Talbiet', 'mn': 'WatClaimCheck', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'WatClaimCheck: nowy zestaw danych do rozszerzania roszczeń i wniosków', 'ro': 'WatClaimCheck: Un nou set de date pentru implicarea și inferența reclamațiilor', 'sr': 'WatClaimCheck: Novi datum podataka za uključenje zahtjeva i povrede', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'WaterClaimCheck: A new data set for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'sv': 'WatClaimCheck: Ett nytt dataset för skadereglering och inferens', 'ur': 'WatClaimCheck: Claim Entailment and Inference کے لئے ایک نئی ڈاٹ آیٹ', 'ta': 'WatClaimCheck: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'uz': 'Check: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'vi': 'Bộ dữ liệu mới về yêu cầu và sự liên quan', 'bg': 'Нов набор от данни за изясняване и заключение на претенции', 'da': 'WatClaimCheck: Et nyt datasæt til skadeserstatning og skadeserstatning', 'nl': 'WatClaimCheck: Een nieuwe Dataset voor Claim Entailment en Inference', 'hr': 'WatClaimCheck: Novi datum podataka za uključenje zahtjeva i poremećaj', 'de': 'WatClaimCheck: Ein neuer Datensatz für Claim Entailment und Inference', 'id': 'WatClaimCheck: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'ko': 'WatClaimCheck: 새로운 클레임 내포 및 추리 데이터 세트', 'fa': 'WatClaimCheck: یک پایگاه اطلاعات جدید برای پایان\u200cبندی و تفاوت', 'sw': 'Check: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'tr': 'watClaimCheck: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'af': "WatClaimCheck: ' n nuwe databasis vir Claim Entailment and Inference", 'sq': 'WatClaimCheck: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'am': 'Check: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'WatClaimCheck: A new data set for Claim Entailment and Inference', 'bn': 'WatClaimCheck: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Infence', 'bs': 'WatClaimCheck: Novi datum podataka za uključenje zahtjeva i nedostatak', 'ca': 'WatClaimCheck: Un nou conjunt de dades per a la malaltia i la inferència de reclamacions', 'cs': 'WatClaimCheck: Nová sada dat pro vylepšení a závěr nároků', 'et': 'WatClaimCheck: uus andmekogum nõuete täiendamiseks ja järeldamiseks', 'fi': 'WatClaimCheck: Uusi tietojoukko Claim Entailment ja Inference', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'WatClaimCheck: nov nabor podatkov za zahtevke in sklepanje', 'bo': 'WatClaimCheck：Claim Entailment and Inference ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་གནས་སྡུད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་', 'ha': 'Check: A new Dataset for Claim Entailment and Infection'}
{'en': 'Low-shot relation extraction (RE) aims to recognize novel relations with very few or even no samples, which is critical in real scenario application. Few-shot and zero-shot RE are two representative low-shot RE tasks, which seem to be with similar target but require totally different underlying abilities. In this paper, we propose Multi-Choice Matching Networks to unify low-shot relation extraction. To fill in the gap between zero-shot and few-shot RE, we propose the triplet-paraphrase meta-training, which leverages triplet paraphrase to pre-train zero-shot label matching ability and uses meta-learning paradigm to learn few-shot instance summarizing ability. Experimental results on three different low-shot RE tasks show that the proposed method outperforms strong baselines by a large margin, and achieve the best performance on few-shot RE leaderboard.', 'fr': "Nous fournissons un nouvel ensemble de données pour la tâche de vérification automatisée des faits et d'évaluation des algorithmes de pointe. L'ensemble de données comprend des allégations (provenant de discours, d'interviews, de médias sociaux et d'articles de presse), des articles de synthèse publiés par des vérificateurs de faits professionnels et des articles de prémisse utilisés par ces vérificateurs de faits professionnels pour étayer leur examen et vérifier la véracité des affirmations. Un défi important dans l'utilisation d'articles de prémisse est l'identification des passages pertinents qui aideront à déduire la véracité d'une allégation. Nous montrons que le transfert d'un modèle de récupération de passages denses formé avec des articles de revue améliore la qualité de récupération des passages dans les articles de prémisse. Nous présentons des résultats pour la prédiction de la véracité des allégations par inférence à partir d'articles de prémisse.", 'pt': 'Contribuímos com um novo conjunto de dados para a tarefa de verificação automatizada de fatos e avaliação de algoritmos de última geração. O conjunto de dados inclui reivindicações (de discursos, entrevistas, mídias sociais e artigos de notícias), artigos de revisão publicados por verificadores de fatos profissionais e artigos de premissa usados por esses verificadores de fatos profissionais para apoiar sua revisão e verificar a veracidade das reivindicações. Um desafio importante no uso de artigos de premissa é a identificação de passagens relevantes que ajudarão a inferir a veracidade de uma afirmação. Mostramos que a transferência de um modelo de recuperação de passagens densas treinado com artigos de revisão melhora a qualidade de recuperação de passagens em artigos de premissa. Relatamos resultados para a previsão da veracidade da afirmação por inferência de artigos de premissa.', 'ar': 'نحن نساهم بمجموعة بيانات جديدة لمهمة التحقق الآلي من الحقائق وتقييم أحدث الخوارزميات. تتضمن مجموعة البيانات ادعاءات (من الخطب والمقابلات ووسائل التواصل الاجتماعي والمقالات الإخبارية) ، ومقالات المراجعة المنشورة بواسطة مدققي الحقائق المحترفين والمقالات المقدمة من قبل هؤلاء المدققين المحترفين في التحقق من الحقائق لدعم مراجعتهم والتحقق من صحة الادعاءات. يتمثل أحد التحديات المهمة في استخدام المقالات الافتتاحية في تحديد المقاطع ذات الصلة التي ستساعد في استنتاج صحة الادعاء. نوضح أن نقل نموذج استرجاع ممر كثيف مدرب بمقالات المراجعة يحسن جودة استرجاع الممرات في المقالات الرئيسية. نقوم بالإبلاغ عن نتائج التنبؤ بمصداقية الادعاء من خلال الاستدلال من المقالات الافتتاحية.', 'es': 'Contribuimos con un nuevo conjunto de datos para la tarea de verificación automática de datos y una evaluación de algoritmos de última generación. El conjunto de datos incluye afirmaciones (de discursos, entrevistas, redes sociales y artículos de noticias), artículos de revisión publicados por verificadores de datos profesionales y artículos de premisas utilizados por esos verificadores de datos profesionales para respaldar su revisión y verificar la veracidad de las afirmaciones. Un desafío importante en el uso de artículos premisas es la identificación de pasajes relevantes que ayudarán a inferir la veracidad de una afirmación. Demostramos que la transferencia de un modelo de recuperación de pasajes densos entrenado con artículos de revisión mejora la calidad de recuperación de pasajes en artículos premisas. Presentamos los resultados para la predicción de la veracidad de la reclamación por inferencia de los artículos de la premisa.', 'ja': '私たちは、自動ファクトチェックと最先端アルゴリズムの評価のタスクのための新しいデータセットを提供します。データセットには、クレーム（スピーチ、インタビュー、ソーシャルメディア、ニュース記事から）、プロのファクトチェッカーが公開したレビュー記事、およびそれらのプロのファクトチェッカーがレビューをサポートし、クレームの真実性を検証するために使用した前提記事が含まれます。前提記事の使用における重要な課題は、主張の真実性を推論するのに役立つ関連する章の特定である。レビュー記事で訓練された密度の高い経路検索モデルを転送すると、前提記事の経路検索品質が向上することが示されています。前提記事からの推論による主張の真偽予測の結果を報告する。', 'zh': '我们为自己事实核料现在算法的事务献了一个新的数据集。 该数集声明(出于演访谈,社交媒体与新闻文),专业事实检查员所发论文及此业事实检查员所以扶察声明真实之文也。  用前提条一要,定有助于推索赔真实相关段落。  吾明移论文之密段落检模可以崇前段落之检。  我们因从前提文章中的推断来报告声明真实的。', 'hi': 'हम स्वचालित तथ्यों की जांच और कला एल्गोरिदम की स्थिति के मूल्यांकन के कार्य के लिए एक नया डेटासेट योगदान करते हैं। डेटासेट में दावे (भाषणों, साक्षात्कारों, सोशल मीडिया और समाचार लेखों से), पेशेवर तथ्य चेकर्स द्वारा प्रकाशित लेखों की समीक्षा और उन पेशेवर तथ्य चेकर्स द्वारा उपयोग किए जाने वाले आधार लेख शामिल हैं जो उनकी समीक्षा का समर्थन करते हैं और दावों की सत्यता को सत्यापित करते हैं।  आधार लेखों के उपयोग में एक महत्वपूर्ण चुनौती प्रासंगिक मार्गों की पहचान है जो दावे की सत्यता का अनुमान लगाने में मदद करेगी।  हम दिखाते हैं कि समीक्षा लेखों के साथ प्रशिक्षित एक घने मार्ग पुनर्प्राप्ति मॉडल को स्थानांतरित करने से आधार लेखों में मार्ग की पुनर्प्राप्ति गुणवत्ता में सुधार होता है।  हम आधार लेख से अनुमान द्वारा दावे की सत्यता की भविष्यवाणी के लिए परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы вносим новый набор данных для задачи автоматизированной проверки фактов и оценки современных алгоритмов. Набор данных включает в себя утверждения (из выступлений, интервью, социальных сетей и новостных статей), обзорные статьи, опубликованные профессиональными фактологическими агентами, и исходные статьи, используемые этими профессиональными фактологическими агентами для обоснования своего рассмотрения и проверки достоверности утверждений.  Важной проблемой в использовании статей о презумпции является определение соответствующих отрывков, которые помогут вывести достоверность претензии.  Мы показываем, что перенос модели поиска плотных пассажей, обученной с обзорными статьями, улучшает качество поиска пассажей в предпосылочных статьях.  Мы сообщаем результаты для прогнозирования правдивости утверждения на основе выводов из статей постулата.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid tacar sonraí nua le haghaidh seiceáil fíricí uathoibrithe agus meastóireacht ar algartam úrscothach. Áiríonn an tacar sonraí éilimh (ó óráidí, agallaimh, na meáin shóisialta agus ailt nuachta), ailt athbhreithnithe arna bhfoilsiú ag seiceálaithe fíricí gairmiúla agus earraí bunráite a úsáideann na seiceálaithe fíricí gairmiúla sin chun tacú lena n-athbhreithniú agus chun fírinneacht na n-éileamh a fhíorú. Dúshlán tábhachtach in úsáid na n-alt mbonn is ea sleachta ábhartha a aithint a chabhróidh le fírinneacht éilimh a thuiscint. Léirímid go bhfeabhsaítear cáilíocht aisghabhála sleachta in earraí bunáite trí mhúnla dlúth aisghabhála pasáiste atá oilte le hailt athbhreithnithe a aistriú. Tuairiscímid torthaí maidir le fírinneacht éileamh a thuar trí thátal ó na hailt réamh-mheastacháin.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას ავტომატიური ფაქტის შემოწმება და ხელოვნის ალგორიტემის სტატის შესახებ. მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში იყენება (სიტყვების, ინტერუქტურების, სოციალური მედიაციის და ნუტური ინტერუქტურების შესახებ), პროფეციალური ფაქტის შემოწმებით გამოიყენებული და პროფეციალური ფაქტის შე მნიშვნელოვანი გამოყენება პრემიზიზიური არქეტების გამოყენებაში არის შესანიშვნელოვანი პასუხების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც დახმარება წარმოდგენის სიმართლე. ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ გადავიტანოთ დუნური პროცესის მოდელს, რომელიც გავაკეთებულია პროცესის მიღება პროცესის მიღება. ჩვენ შეგვიყვანეთ წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენისთვის წარმოდგენისთვის წარმოდგენისთვის სინამდვილეობას, რომელიც წარმოდგენა პრე', 'el': 'Συμβάλλουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων για το έργο του αυτοματοποιημένου ελέγχου γεγονότων και της αξιολόγησης των σύγχρονων αλγορίθμων. Το σύνολο δεδομένων περιλαμβάνει ισχυρισμούς (από ομιλίες, συνεντεύξεις, άρθρα κοινωνικών μέσων και ειδήσεων), άρθρα ανασκόπησης που δημοσιεύονται από επαγγελματίες ελεγκτές γεγονότων και άρθρα που χρησιμοποιούνται από αυτούς τους επαγγελματίες ελεγκτές γεγονότων για την υποστήριξη της αναθεώρησης τους και την επαλήθευση της αληθείας των ισχυρισμών. Μια σημαντική πρόκληση στη χρήση των άρθρων προϋποθέσεων είναι ο προσδιορισμός των σχετικών αποσπασμάτων που θα βοηθήσουν να συναχθεί η αλήθεια μιας αξίωσης. Δείχνουμε ότι η μεταφορά ενός μοντέλου ανάκτησης πυκνού περάσματος εκπαιδευμένου με άρθρα ανασκόπησης βελτιώνει την ποιότητα ανάκτησης των περάσεων σε άρθρα εγκαταστάσεων. Αναφέρουμε αποτελέσματα για την πρόβλεψη της αληθείας ισχυρισμών με συμπέρασμα από άρθρα προϋπόθεσης.', 'hu': 'Az automatizált tényállás és a korszerű algoritmusok értékelése céljából új adatkészlettel járunk hozzá. Az adatkészlet tartalmazza az állításokat (beszédekből, interjúkból, közösségi médiából és hírekből), a szakmai tényállítók által publikált cikkeket, valamint a szakmai tényállítók által felhasznált előzetes cikkeket, amelyeket az állítások valódiságának alátámasztására és igazolására használnak. A helyiségi cikkek használatának fontos kihívása a releváns részek azonosítása, amelyek segítenek egy állítás valóságának következtetésében. Megmutatjuk, hogy a felülvizsgálati cikkekkel képzett sűrű átjáró visszakeresési modell átvitele javítja a helyszíni cikkekben lévő részek visszakeresési minőségét. Az állítások valódiságának előrejelzéséhez szükséges eredményeket a helyi cikkekből származó következtetés alapján jelentjük.', 'it': "Contribuiamo con un nuovo set di dati per il compito di controllo automatizzato dei fatti e una valutazione degli algoritmi all'avanguardia. Il dataset include affermazioni (da discorsi, interviste, social media e articoli di notizie), articoli di revisione pubblicati da esperti di verifica dei fatti e articoli di premessa utilizzati da tali esperti di verifica dei fatti per sostenere la loro revisione e verificare la veridicità delle affermazioni. Una sfida importante nell'uso degli articoli di premessa è l'identificazione di passaggi rilevanti che aiuteranno a dedurre la veridicità di un reclamo. Mostriamo che il trasferimento di un modello denso di recupero del passaggio addestrato con articoli di revisione migliora la qualità di recupero dei passaggi negli articoli premise. Riportiamo i risultati per la previsione della veridicità del claim per inferenza dagli articoli premise.", 'mk': 'We contribute a new dataset for the task of automated fact checking and an evaluation of state of the art algorithms.  Податоците вклучуваат тврдења (од говорови, интервјуа, социјални медиуми и новински статии), преглед на статиите објавени од професионалните проверки на факти и претпоставки статии кои ги користат тие професионални проверки на факти за поддршка на нивното преглед и пот Важен предизвик во употребата на предметите е идентификацијата на релевантните премини кои ќе помогнат во заклучувањето на вистината на тврдеоето. Ние покажуваме дека пренесувањето на глупав модел за преземање на премини обучен со ревизиски статии го подобрува квалитетот на преземањето на премините во претпоставените статии. Ние известуваме за резултатите за предвидувањето на веројатноста на тврдењата со конференција од претпоставените статии.', 'lt': 'Mes prisidedame prie naujo duomenų rinkinio, skirto automatizuotai tikrinti faktus ir įvertinti naujausius algoritmus. Duomenų rinkinys apima pareiškimus (iš kalbų, pokalbių, socialinės žiniasklaidos ir naujienų straipsnių), profesionalių faktų tikrintojų paskelbtus straipsnius ir tų profesionalių faktų tikrintojų naudojamus patalpų straipsnius jų peržiūrai remti ir reikalavimų teisingumui patikrinti. Svarbus uždavinys, susijęs su patalpų gaminių naudojimu, yra nustatyti atitinkamus punktus, kurie padės nustatyti tvirtinimo tikrumą. Mes parodome, kad tankios perėjimo prie kelio modelio, parengto peržiūros straipsniais, perdavimas gerina perėjimo prie patalpų straipsnių kokybę. We report results for the prediction of claim veracity by inference from premise articles.', 'kk': 'Біз автоматты түрде тексеру және сурет алгоритмдерінің күйін бағалау үшін жаңа деректер жинағына көмектесеміз. Деректер жиында (сөйлеу, сұрақтар, социалдық медиа және жаңалық мақалалардан) жазылған мақалаларды қарау және бұл профессионалдық факт тексерушерінің қолданылатын мақалаларды қарау және сұрақтардың дұрыстығын тексеру үшін қо Премия мақалаларын қолдану үшін маңызды мәселе - жағдайдың дұрыстығын көмектесетін пайдалануын анықтау. Біз қарау мақалаларымен оқылған ұзындық жүгірту үлгісін алу үлгісін көрсеткіземіз, премьер мақалаларында жүгірту сапатын жақсартады. Біз премиз мақалаларынан шындықтығын бақылау үшін нәтижелерді есептеп береміз.', 'ms': 'Kami menyumbang set data baru untuk tugas pemeriksaan fakta automatik dan penilaian algoritma kemajuan. Set data mengandungi klaim (dari ucapan, temuduga, media sosial dan artikel berita), ulasan artikel yang diterbitkan oleh pemeriksa fakta profesional dan artikel premis yang digunakan oleh pemeriksa fakta profesional untuk menyokong ulasan mereka dan mengesahkan kebenaran klaim. Satu cabaran penting dalam penggunaan artikel premis adalah pengenalan laluan yang berkaitan yang akan membantu untuk menentukan kebenaran tuntutan. Kami menunjukkan bahawa pemindahan model pemulihan laluan tebal dilatih dengan artikel penyelidikan meningkatkan kualiti pemulihan laluan dalam artikel premis. Kami melaporkan keputusan untuk ramalan kebenaran tuntutan oleh kesimpulan dari artikel premis.', 'mt': 'Aħna nikkontribwixxu sett ġdid ta’ dejta għall-kompitu ta’ verifika awtomatizzata tal-fatti u evalwazzjoni tal-algoritmi l-aktar avvanzati. Is-sett tad-dejta jinkludi pretensjonijiet (minn diskorsi, intervisti, midja soċjali u artikoli tal-aħbarijiet), artikoli ta’ reviżjoni ppubblikati minn verifikaturi professjonali tal-fatti u artikoli ta’ premessa użati minn dawk il-verifikaturi professjonali tal-fatti biex jappoġġjaw ir-reviżjoni tagħhom u jivverifikaw il-veraċità tal-pretensjonijiet. Sfida importanti fl-użu ta’ oġġetti tal-bini hija l-identifikazzjoni ta’ passaġġi rilevanti li se jgħinu biex tiġi konkluża l-veraċità ta’ talba. Aħna nuru li t-trasferiment ta’ mudell dens ta’ rkupru ta’ passaġġi mħarreġ b’artikoli ta’ reviżjoni jtejjeb il-kwalità ta’ rkupru ta’ passaġġi fl-artikoli tal-bini. Aħna nirrappurtaw ir-riżultati għat-tbassir tal-veraċità tal-pretensjonijiet permezz ta’ inferenza minn oġġetti tal-premessa.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് പങ്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെ അവസ്ഥ പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും വേണ്ടി. ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്നു (വാക്കുകള്\u200d, സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ, വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d പ്രസിദ്ധീകരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്നു), പ്രൊഫഷണല്\u200d കാര്യം പരിശ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ലേഖനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വ്യാല്\u200dക്കാലം അതാണ് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പാസേജുകളുടെ  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് മുന്\u200dഗ്രിമെന്\u200dറുകളില്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു കഠിനമായ പാസ്സേജിന്\u200dറെ ഗുണപ്രകാരം മ മുന്നറിയിപ്പുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അപകടത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും മുന്നറിയിപ്പുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സത്യത്തിന്റെ പ', 'no': 'Vi bidra til ein ny dataset for oppgåva av automatisk sjekking av faktum og evaluering av tilstanden til kunstalgoritmen. Datasettet inkluderer etterspørseler (frå språk, intervjuar, sosiale mediar og nyhetsinnstillingar), gjennomsikt av artiklar utgjeven av profesjonelle faktisksjekkarar og prøveartiklar brukt av dei profesjonelle faktiske sjekkarar for å støtta gjennomsikt og verifisera sannheten av tiltak. @ info Eit viktig utfordring i bruk av premise artiklar er identifikasjonen av relevante passager som vil hjelpa til å gjera sannheten på eit oppgåve. Vi viser at overføring av ein tett passasjonsmodul som treng med gjennomsikt- artiklar forbedrar kvaliteten til henting av passasjonar i premise- artiklar. Vi rapporterer resultatet for forhåndsvising av sannsynligheten etter inferens frå premise artiklar.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy nowy zestaw danych do zadania automatycznego sprawdzania faktów oraz oceny najnowocześniejszych algorytmów. Zestaw danych obejmuje roszczenia (z przemówień, wywiadów, mediów społecznościowych i artykułów wiadomościowych), artykuły recenzyjne publikowane przez profesjonalnych kontrolerów faktów oraz artykuły założone wykorzystywane przez tych profesjonalnych kontrolerów faktów do wsparcia ich przeglądu i weryfikacji prawdziwości twierdzeń. Ważnym wyzwaniem w stosowaniu artykułów założeniowych jest identyfikacja odpowiednich fragmentów, które pomogą wywnioskować prawdziwość roszczenia. Pokazujemy, że przeniesienie modelu odzyskiwania gęstych przejść trenowanego artykułami recenzyjnymi poprawia jakość odzyskiwania przejść w artykułach lokalnych. Raportujemy wyniki przewidywania prawdziwości roszczeń poprzez wnioski z artykułów założeniowych.', 'mn': 'Бид автоматжуулсан үнэний шалгалтын ажлын шинэ өгөгдлийн санг, урлагийн алгоритмын байдлын үнэлгээ дэмжиж байна. Дасгал өгөгдлийн санд зөвлөгөө (ярилцлага, ярилцлага, нийгмийн хэвлэл, мэдээллийн баримт), мэргэжлийн үнэний шинжилгээчүүдийн шинжилгээ, тэдгээр мэргэжлийн үнэний шинжилгээчүүдийн шинжилгээ дэмжиж, үнэнийг шалгахын тулд Холбооны баримтуудын хэрэглээнд чухал сорилт бол хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэхэд тусалдаг захиралтуудын тодорхойлолт юм. Бид шинжилгээний баримтуудтай сургалтын жинхэнэ загвар авах загварыг дамжуулах нь анхны баримтуудад дамжуулах чадварыг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид хүлээн зөвшөөрөл байдлын төсөөллийн үр дүнг зарцуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Contribuim cu un nou set de date pentru sarcina de verificare automată a faptelor și o evaluare a algoritmilor de ultimă generație. Setul de date include afirmații (de la discursuri, interviuri, social media și articole de știri), articole de revizuire publicate de verificatori profesioniști și articole de premisă utilizate de acei verificatori profesioniști pentru a susține revizuirea lor și a verifica veridicitatea afirmațiilor. O provocare importantă în utilizarea articolelor de premisă este identificarea pasajelor relevante care vor ajuta la deducerea veridicității unei afirmații. Arătăm că transferul unui model dens de recuperare a pasajelor instruit cu articole de revizuire îmbunătățește calitatea de recuperare a pasajelor din articolele de premisă. Raportăm rezultatele pentru predicția veridicității afirmațiilor prin deducție din articolele de premisă.', 'so': 'Waxaynu ka qeybqaadanaynaa sawir cusub oo loo sameeyo shaqada koontaroolka xaqiiqda iyo qiimeynta xaaladda farshaxanka. Taariikhda waxaa ku jira dacwado (hadallo, wareysiyo, macluumaadka bulshada iyo warqadaha habari), ka fiiriso warqadaha laga soo daabacay koontarooyinka runta ah iyo warqadaha hore ee loo isticmaalay hubsada baaritaankooda iyo xaqiijinta qirashada. Caqabadaha muhiimka ah ee isticmaalka alaabta hore waa aqoonsiga baasaboorada la xiriira, kaasoo caawinaya inay saameyso daacadnimada codsiga. Waxan tusnaynaa in beddelka modelka dib u qaadashada ee hoos u dheer oo lagu baray qoraallada baaritaanka lagu qoray inuu beddelo qiimaha helitaanka baasaboorka oo ku qoran qoraalka hore. ... Waxaannu wargelinaynaa sababta loo sii sheegay in ay ku imaaneyso daacadnimo ay ka timaadaan warqadaha hore.', 'sr': 'Mi doprinosimo novu setu podataka za zadatak automatskog provjere činjenica i procjenu stanja umjetničkih algoritma. Podaci uključuju tvrdnju (iz govora, intervjua, društvenih medija i novinskih članaka), pregledaju članak objavljene profesionalnim provjeravačima činjenica i predstavljaju članak koji koriste te profesionalne provjeravačice činjenica kako bi podržali njihovu pregled i proverili istinu tvrdnji. Važan izazov u upotrebi premijskih članaka je identifikacija relevantnih prolaza koji će pomoæi da uvjeri istinu tvrdnje. Pokazujemo da prenošenje gustog model a prikupljanja prolaza obučenog člancima za pregled poboljšava kvalitet prikupljanja prolaza u premijskim člancima. Prijavljujemo rezultate za predviđenje istine zahteva inferencijom iz premijskih članaka.', 'sv': 'Vi bidrar med ett nytt dataset för uppgiften att automatisera faktakontroll och en utvärdering av de senaste algoritmerna. Datauppsättningen innehåller påståenden (från tal, intervjuer, sociala medier och nyhetsartiklar), granskningsartiklar publicerade av professionella faktakontrollerare och premiusartiklar som används av dessa professionella faktakontrollerare för att stödja deras granskning och verifiera riktigheten av påståenden. En viktig utmaning vid användningen av premisartiklar är identifieringen av relevanta passager som hjälper till att härleda sanningsenheten i ett påstående. Vi visar att överföring av en tät passagemodell utbildad med granskningsartiklar förbättrar hämtning kvaliteten på passager i premissartiklar. Vi rapporterar resultat för förutsägelse av påståendens sanningsenlighet genom inferens från premisartiklar.', 'si': 'අපි අළුත් දත්ත සෙට් එකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සහ කළු ඇල්ගෝරිතම් ස්ථිතියේ වි දත්ත සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයි (කතාවක්, සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම සහ වාර්තාවක් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ),  ප්\u200dරධාන පිළිපත් භාවිතා කරන්න වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න උදව් කරන්න. අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න අපි ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිපත්තියෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිපත්තියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිපත්ත විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිපත්ත', 'ur': 'ہم نے آٹ الگوریٹم کے موقعیت و تحقیق کے کام کے لئے ایک نوی ڈیٹ سٹ کا اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ڈاٹ سٹ میں مثالیں (بولیاں، انٹوریوں، سوسیلی میڈیا اور نیویوریوں سے) لکھی ہوئی لکھی ہوئی ہیں، پروفسونیل حقیقت چیکر کے ذریعے منتشر کئے ہوئے لکھے ہوئے لکھے ہوئے لکھے ہوئے ہیں اور ان پروفسونیل حقیقت چیکر کے ذریعے استعمال کئے ہوئے اپنا معاملہ کے استعمال میں ایک اہم چال یہ ہے کہ معاملہ مسافروں کی شناسایی ہے جو ایک معاملہ کی سچائی کے ذریعے مدد کریں گے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک گہرے مسافر پھیر لینے کی مدل کی ترکیب کے ذریعے لکھی ہوئی مطابق لکھی ہوئی مطابق لکھی ہوئی مطابق مسافروں کے پھیر لینے کی کیفیت اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ ہم فرصت کی تصدیق کے لئے نتیجے گزارتے ہیں کہ حقیقت کی پیش بینی کے ذریعہ پیش بینی کریں۔', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய தகவல் அமைப்புக்கு பங்கு செய்கிறோம் தானாகவே தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட உண்மையை சரிபார்ப்பதற்காகவும் கல தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் கூறுகள் (பேச்சு, கேட்டுக்கள், சமூக ஊடகங்கள் மற்றும் செய்தி கட்டுரைகளிலிருந்து, தொழில் உண்மை தேர்வு செய்பவர்களால் வெளியிட்ட கட்டுரைகளை முன்ன முன்னிருப்பு கட்டுரைகளை பயன்படுத்துவதில் முக்கியமான சவால் நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் முன்னிருப்பு கட்டுரைகளில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட ஒரு கூட்டு கடவுச்சொல்லை மீட்டெடுப்பு மாதிரியு நாம் முன்னிருப்பு கட்டுரைகளிலிருந்து குறைப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனையின் முடிவுகளை அறிவிக்கும்.', 'uz': "Biz avtomatik tasdiqlash va rasm algorithining holatini qiymatlash uchun yangi maʼlumot satrini bajaramiz. @ info @ info Biz quyidagi maqolalarni tahrirlash bilan bogʻliq maxfiy soʻzni olib tashlash modelini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Oldingi maqolalarda maxfiy soʻzlarni olish imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Biz oldingi maqolalardan hech qanday qiymati yordamida to'g'ri so'rayotni hisoblash uchun natijalari haqida hisoblanamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đóng góp một bộ dữ liệu mới cho nhiệm vụ kiểm tra thực tế tự động và đánh giá thuật toán hiện đại. Bộ dữ liệu chứa các yêu cầu (từ các bài phát biểu, phỏng vấn, truyền thông xã hội và tin tức), các bài bản tóm tắt được xuất bản bởi các nhà kiểm tra thực tế chuyên nghiệp và các bài báo được sử dụng để hỗ trợ việc kiểm tra và xác thực các yêu cầu. Một thách thức quan trọng trong việc sử dụng các bài báo tiền sử là phải xác định các đoạn liên quan có thể giúp khẳng định sự thật của yêu cầu. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc di chuyển một mô hình thu hồi đường mật độ dày đặc được huấn luyện với các bài phê bình cải tiến chất lượng trích đoạn trong các bài báo tiền sử. Chúng tôi báo cáo kết quả cho dự đoán của tuyên bố sự công bằng dựa trên các báo cáo.', 'bg': 'Прилагаме нов набор от данни за автоматизирана проверка на фактите и оценка на най-съвременните алгоритми. Наборът от данни включва твърдения (от речи, интервюта, социални медии и новинарски статии), статии за рецензии, публикувани от професионални проверяващи факти и статии за предпоставки, използвани от тези професионални проверяващи факти в подкрепа на техния преглед и проверка на истинността на твърденията. Важно предизвикателство при използването на статии от помещенията е идентифицирането на съответните пасажи, които ще помогнат да се направи извод за истинността на дадено твърдение. Показваме, че прехвърлянето на модел за възстановяване на плътен пасаж, обучен с ревю статии, подобрява качеството на извличане на пасажи в обектните статии. Докладваме резултати за прогнозиране на истинността на претенцията чрез извод от статии в помещенията.', 'nl': 'We dragen een nieuwe dataset bij voor de taak van geautomatiseerde fact checking en een evaluatie van state of the art algoritmes. De dataset omvat claims (uit speeches, interviews, social media en nieuwsberichten), review artikelen gepubliceerd door professionele fact checkers en premise artikelen gebruikt door deze professionele fact checkers om hun beoordeling te ondersteunen en de waarachtigheid van de claims te verifiëren. Een belangrijke uitdaging bij het gebruik van premise artikelen is het identificeren van relevante passages die zullen helpen om de waarheid van een claim te achterhalen. We tonen aan dat het overbrengen van een compact passage retrieval model getraind met review artikelen de retrieval kwaliteit van passages in premise artikelen verbetert. We rapporteren resultaten voor de voorspelling van claimwaarachtigheid door conclusie uit premise artikelen.', 'da': 'Vi bidrager med et nyt datasæt til opgaven med automatiseret fact checking og en evaluering af state of te art algoritmer. Datasættet indeholder påstande (fra taler, interviews, sociale medier og nyhedsartikler), gennemgang af artikler udgivet af professionelle fact checkere og premise artikler, der bruges af disse professionelle fact checkere til at understøtte deres gennemgang og verificere påstandenes sandhed. En vigtig udfordring i brugen af premise artikler er identifikationen af relevante passager, der vil bidrage til at udlede sandheden af en påstand. Vi viser, at overførsel af en tæt passage hentningsmodel trænet med review artikler forbedrer hentningskvaliteten af passager i premise artikler. Vi rapporterer resultater til forudsigelse af påstandens sandhed ved udledning af premise artikler.', 'hr': 'Mi doprinosimo novu kompletu podataka za zadatak automatskog provjere činjenica i procjenu stanja umjetničkih algoritma. Podaci uključuju zahtjeve (iz govora, intervjua, društvenih medija i novinskih članaka), pregledaju članak objavljene profesionalnim provjeravačima činjenica i predstavljaju članak koji su koristili te provjeravači profesionalnih činjenica kako bi podržali njihovu pregled i provjerili istinu zahtjeva. Važan izazov u upotrebi premijskih članaka je identifikacija relevantnih prolaza koji će pomoći uvjeriti istinu tvrdnje. Pokazujemo da prenošenje gustog model prikupljanja prolaza obučenog članicama za pregled poboljšava kvalitet prikupljanja prolaza u premijskim članicama. Prijavljujemo rezultate za predviđanje istine tvrdnje inferencijom iz premijskih članaka.', 'de': 'Wir bringen einen neuen Datensatz für die Aufgabe der automatisierten Faktenüberprüfung und einer Auswertung von State-of-the-Art Algorithmen bei. Der Datensatz umfasst Behauptungen (aus Reden, Interviews, Social Media und Nachrichtenartikeln), Review-Artikel, die von professionellen Faktenprüfern veröffentlicht wurden und Prämisseartikel, die von diesen professionellen Faktenprüfern verwendet werden, um ihre Überprüfung zu unterstützen und die Wahrhaftigkeit der Behauptungen zu überprüfen. Eine wichtige Herausforderung bei der Verwendung von Prämisseartikeln ist die Identifizierung relevanter Passagen, die helfen, die Wahrhaftigkeit eines Anspruchs abzuleiten. Wir zeigen, dass die Übertragung eines mit Review-Artikeln trainierten dichten Passage Retrieval-Modells die Retrieval-Qualität von Passagen in Prämisseartikeln verbessert. Wir berichten Ergebnisse zur Vorhersage der Anspruchswahrheit durch Schlussfolgerung aus Prämisseartikeln.', 'ko': '우리는 가장 선진적인 알고리즘을 자동으로 검사하고 평가하는 데 사용되는 새로운 데이터 집합을 제공했다.이 데이터 세트에는 발표문(강연, 인터뷰, 소셜 미디어, 뉴스 기사), 전문 팩트 체크리스트가 발표한 논평문, 전문 팩트 체크리스트가 성명의 진실성을 검토하고 검증하기 위한 전제 글이 포함되어 있다.전제관사를 사용하는 중요한 도전은 관련 단락을 식별하는 것이다. 이것은 클레임의 진실성을 추론하는 데 도움이 될 것이다.우리는 평론 문장 훈련의 밀집된 문장 검색 모델을 옮기면 전제 문장 중의 문장 검색의 질을 높일 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 전제 문장을 통해 클레임의 정확성을 추리하여 예측한 결과를 보고하였다.', 'id': 'Kami berkontribusi dataset baru untuk tugas pemeriksaan fakta otomatis dan evaluasi algoritma terbaik. Set data termasuk klaim (dari pidato, wawancara, media sosial dan artikel berita), ulasan artikel yang diterbitkan oleh pemeriksa fakta profesional dan artikel premise yang digunakan oleh pemeriksa fakta profesional untuk mendukung ulasan mereka dan verifikasi kebenaran klaim. Sebuah tantangan penting dalam penggunaan artikel premise adalah identifikasi pasar-pasar relevan yang akan membantu untuk menyimpulkan kebenaran klaim. Kami menunjukkan bahwa pemindahan model penerbangan tebal dilatih dengan artikel penelitian meningkatkan kualitas penerbangan penerbangan dalam artikel premise. Kami melaporkan hasil untuk prediksi kebenaran klaim oleh kesimpulan dari artikel premise.', 'fa': 'ما یک مجموعه اطلاعات جدید برای کار بررسی حقیقت خودکار و ارزیابی وضعیت الگوریتم هنر را شریک می\u200cدهیم. مجموعه داده\u200cها (از سخنرانی، مصاحبه\u200cها، رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی و مصاحبه\u200cهای اخبار) شامل می\u200cشوند، مقاله\u200cهایی که توسط بررسی\u200cکنندگان حقیقت حرفه\u200cای منتشر شده و مقاله\u200cهایی که توسط آن بررسی\u200cکنندگان حقیقت حرفه\u200cای استفاده می\u200cکنند،  یک چالش مهم در استفاده از مقاله\u200cهای پیشینیان شناسایی مسیرهای مربوط به آن است که کمک می\u200cکند تا حقیقت یک ادعا را تحریک کند. ما نشان می دهیم که انتقال یک مدل دریافت کردن مسیر گسترده با مقاله های تحقیق آموزش داده شده، کیفیت دریافت مسیر در مقاله های پیشینیان بهتر می شود. ما نتیجه\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی حقیقت ادعا را با آلودگی از مقاله\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی گزارش می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Tunachangia seti mpya ya taarifa kwa jukumu la kutafuta ukweli na tathmini za hali ya sanaa. Taarifa hiyo inajumuisha madai (kutokana na hotuba, mahojiano, mitandao ya kijamii na makala za habari), kufuatilia makala zilizochapishwa na wataalamu wa ukweli na makala zilizotumiwa na waandishi wa taarifa hizo za kitaalam ili kuunga mkono utafiti wao na kuthibitisha ukweli wa madai hayo. … An important challenge in the use of premise articles is the identification of relevant passages that will help to infer the veracity of a claim.   Tunaonyesha kwamba kubadilisha muundo wa upatikanaji mzito wa upatikanaji wa upatikanaji ulioelekezwa na makala za kufuatilia inaboresha kiwango cha upatikanaji wa njia katika makala za awali. ... Tunatoa taarifa za matokeo ya utabiri wa kudai ukweli na kutokuwepo kwa ugonjwa wa makala za awali.', 'tr': 'Biz öz otomatik faýllary barlamak we sungat algoritmalaryň durumyny barlamak üçin täze bir dataset kömekleyiriz Veri setirinde (sözlerinden, görüşmelerden, sosyal medýýatlardan we habarlar makalaryndan), profesyonel fakt checkleriň tarapyndan netijä edilen makalary barlamak we şol profesyonel fakt checkleriň tarapyndan ulanylan makalary barlamak we soňularyň hakykatyny barlamak üçin barlamak üçin barlamak isleýärler. Örnek maşgalaryň ullanyşynda wajyp kynçylyk, bir iddialanyň hakykatyny çykarmak üçin kömek edip biljek geçişlerin kimligidir. Biz çyk bir geçiş alma modelini gözlemek maddeleri ile eğitilen okuwçylar üçin ön makallerde geçişin kalitesini geliştirir. Biz başlangyç makalaryndan azajyk bilen iddia edilýän dogruçylygyň öňünden geçirmegi üçin netijeleri baglaýarys.', 'af': "Ons bydra 'n nuwe datastel vir die taak van outomatiese faktiestoets en 'n evaluering van staat van die kuns algoritme. Die datastel inkluit voorwaardes (van speletjies, intervjuis, sosiale media en nuusartikels), hersien artikels uitgepubliseer deur profesionale fakte kontroleerders en premiseer artikels gebruik deur dié profesionale fakte kontroleerders om hul hersiening te ondersteun en die waarheid van die voorwaardes te bevestig. 'n belangrike uitdrukking in die gebruik van premise artikels is die identifikasie van relevante wagte wat sal help om die waarheid van 'n aandrukking te verwyder. Ons wys dat die oordraging van 'n dense pad ontvang model wat onderwerp is met hersiening aktikels, verbeter die ontvang kwaliteit van wagte in premise artikels. Ons rapporteer resultate vir die voorskou van voorskoude waarheid deur inferensie van premise artikels.", 'sq': 'Ne kontribuojmë një grup të ri të dhënash për detyrën e kontrollit automatik të fakteve dhe një vlerësim të algoritmave më të lartë. Grupi i të dhënave përfshin pretendime (nga fjalimet, intervistat, mediat shoqërore dhe artikujt e lajmeve), shqyrtime artikujsh botuar nga kontrolluesit profesionistë të fakteve dhe artikuj të përdorura nga ata kontrolluesit profesionistë të fakteve për të mbështetur shqyrtimin e tyre dhe verifikuar vërtetësinë e pretendimeve. Një sfidë e rëndësishme në përdorimin e artikujve të premtesës është identifikimi i pasazheve të rëndësishme që do të ndihmojnë për të përfshirë vërtetësinë e një pretendimi. Ne tregojmë se transferimi i një modeli të dendur për marrjen e pasazheve të trajnuar me artikuj të shqyrtimit përmirëson cilësinë e marrjes së pasazheve në artikujt e premtesave. Ne raportojmë rezultatet për parashikimin e vërtetësisë së pretendimeve nga përfundimi nga artikujt e premtesave.', 'am': 'አዲስ የዳታ ሰርቨር አዲስ አዲስ አካል ማረጋገጫ እና የአርላንድ አቋራጭ ሥርዓት ማረጋገጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዳታ ሳጥን (ከንግግር፣ interview፣ ማኅበራዊ አውታር እና የዜና ቃላት)፣ የባሕላዊ ውይይት ማረፊያዎች እና የእነዚህ ባለፊያ ውይይት ፈተናዎችን ለመደገፍ እና የክስ እውነተኛውን ለማረጋገጥ በተጠቃሚ ሕግጋቶች ላይ የሚደረጉትን ጽሑፎችን በመጠየቅ ይቀጥጣሉ፡፡ የቀድሞው ዕቅላት በመጠቀም የሚያስፈልገው የሥርዓት አካባቢ መግለጫ ማረጋገጫ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ጽሑፎች በመመለስ የተማረከውን የሥልጣን ማቀናጃ ሞዴል በመለስ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የፊደል ጽሑፎች ውጤት በሚያሳፍርበት ውጤት እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներդրում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ ավտոմատիկ փաստերի ստուգելու և ամենաբարձր ալգորիթմների գնահատման խնդրի համար: Տեղեկատվական համակարգը ներառում է հայտարարություններ (ելույթների, հարցազրույցների, սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների և նորությունների հոդվածների արդյունքում), մասնագիտական փաստերի ստուգերի հրատարակված հոդվածներ և նախատեսված հոդվածներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են այդ մասնագիտական փաստերի ստու Պարտադրյալ հոդվածների օգտագործման կարևոր մարտահրավերն է նշանակալի հատվածների բացահայտումը, որը կօգնի պարզել փաստարկության ճշմարտությունը: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ խիստ հատվածի վերադարձման մոդելի փոխանցումը, որը պատրաստված է վերանայման հոդվածներով, բարելավում է նախատեսված հոդվածների հատվածների վերադարձման որակը: Մենք զեկուցում ենք արդյունքներ փաստարկման ճշմարտության կանխագուշակության արդյունքների արդյունքներից ըստ ենթադրության հոդվածների:', 'az': 'Biz avtomatik faktlarńĪn t…ôŇükil etm…ôsi v…ô sanat algoritminin durumunu deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn yeni veril…ôn qurńüunu q…ôbul edirik. Veri qurńüularńĪ (s√∂hb…ôtl…ôr, intervjular, sosyal mediyalar v…ô x…ôb…ôrl…ôr m…ôktublarńĪndan), profesyonel fakt t…ôŇükil…ôri t…ôŇükil ed…ôn m…ôktublarńĪ t…ôŇükil edir v…ô t…ôŇükill…ôrinin dońüruluńüunu t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôk v…ô t…ôŇükil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô ed…ôn profesyonel fakt t…ôŇükil…ôri t…ôŇükil edirl…ôr. YaxńĪnlńĪq m…ôktublarńĪn istifad…ôsind…ô m√∂h√ľm bir √ß…ôtinlikdir ki, bir iddianńĪn dońüruluńüunu azaltmańüa k√∂m…ôk ed…ôr. Biz g√∂st…ôririk ki, √ß…ôtin bir ke√ßiŇü alma modelini t…ôhsil edil…ôn m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr il…ô t…ôhsil edil…ôn m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôr t…ôhsil edil…ôn m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôrd…ô ke√ßiŇü kvalitetini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. Biz …ôvv…ôlki m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôrd…ôn h…ôqiq…ôti t…ôsbit etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ bildiririk.', 'bn': 'আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তথ্য পরীক্ষা এবং শিল্প অ্যালগরিদমের অবস্থার মূল্যের জন্য একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট অবদান করি। The dataset includes claims (from speeches, interviews, social media and news articles), review articles published by professional fact checkers and premise articles used by those professional fact checkers to support their review and verify the veracity of the claims.   প্রাথমিক প্রবন্ধ ব্যবহারের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ চ্যালেঞ্জ হচ্ছে প্রয়োজনীয় পাসগুলোর পরিচয় যা দাবীর সত্যতাকে কমিয়ে দেবে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে প্রাথমিক প্রবন্ধে প্রশিক্ষিত গভীর প্যাসেজ পুনরুদ্ধার মডেল পরিবর্তন করার জন্য প্রশিক্ষিত হয়েছে প্রবন্ধের প আমরা প্রাথমিক প্রবন্ধের ক্ষেত্রে অসংক্রান্ত প্রতিবেদনের ফলাফল প্রতিবেদন করছি।', 'ca': "Contribuim un nou conjunt de dades per a la tasca de verificació automatitzada de fets i una evaluació dels algoritmes més avançats. El conjunt de dades inclou reclamacions (a partir de discursos, entrevistes, mitjans socials i articles de notícies), revisions d'articles publicats per verificadors de fets professionals i premises d'articles utilitzats per a sostenir la seva revisió i verificar la veritat de les reclamacions. Un repte important en l'ús d'articles premises és la identificació de passatges pertinents que ajudaran a deduir la veritat d'una reclamació. Mostrem que transferir un model dens de recuperació de passatges entrenat amb articles de revisió millora la qualitat de recuperació de passatges en articles premises. We report results for the prediction of claim veracity by inference from premise articles.", 'cs': 'Přinášíme nový datový soubor pro úkol automatizované kontroly faktů a vyhodnocování nejmodernějších algoritmů. Soubor dat zahrnuje tvrzení (z projevů, rozhovorů, sociálních médií a zpravodajských článků), recenzní články publikované profesionálními kontrolory faktů a články používané těmito profesionálními kontrolory faktů k podpoře jejich revize a ověření pravdivosti tvrzení. Důležitou výzvou při používání předpokladních článků je identifikace relevantních pasáží, které pomohou odvodit pravdivost nároku. Ukazujeme, že přenos hustého průchodového modelu trénovaného recenzními články zlepšuje kvalitu vyhledávání průchodů v premise článcích. Výsledky predikce pravdivosti reklamací vykazujeme odvozením z předpokladních článků.', 'bs': 'Mi doprinosimo novu setu podataka za zadatak automatskog provjere činjenica i procjenu stanja umjetničkih algoritma. Podaci uključuju tvrdnju (iz govora, intervjua, društvenih medija i novinskih članaka), pregledaju članak objavljene profesionalnim provjeravačima činjenica i predstavljaju članak koji su koristili te provjeravači profesionalnih činjenica kako bi podržali njihovu pregled i provjerili istinu tvrdnji. Važan izazov u upotrebi premijskih članaka je identifikacija relevantnih prolaza koji će pomoći da uvjeri istinu tvrdnje. Pokazujemo da prenošenje gustog model prikupljanja prolaza obučenog članovima za pregled poboljšava kvalitet prikupljanja prolaza u premijskim članovima. Prijavljujemo rezultate za predviđanje istine tvrdnje inferencijom iz premijskih članaka.', 'et': 'Lisame uue andmekogumi automatiseeritud faktide kontrollimiseks ja uusimate algoritmide hindamiseks. Andmekogum sisaldab väiteid (kõnedest, intervjuudest, sotsiaalmeediast ja uudisteartiklitest), professionaalsete faktikontrollijate avaldatud ülevaateartikleid ja eelduseartikleid, mida professionaalsed faktikontrollijad kasutavad oma ülevaate toetamiseks ja väidete õigsuse kontrollimiseks. Oluline väljakutse ruumiartiklite kasutamisel on asjakohaste lõigete kindlakstegemine, mis aitavad järeldada väite õigsust. Näitame, et ülevaateartiklitega koolitatud tiheda läbipääsu taastamise mudeli üleviimine parandab ruumiartiklite läbipääsu taastamise kvaliteeti. Esitame väite õigsuse prognoosimise tulemused eelduseartiklite alusel.', 'fi': 'Luomme uuden aineiston automatisoituun faktatarkistukseen ja uusimpien algoritmien arviointiin. Aineisto sisältää väitteet (puheista, haastatteluista, sosiaalisesta mediasta ja uutisartikkeleista), ammattimaisten faktatarkastajien julkaisemat arviointiartikkelit sekä alustaartikkelit, joita nämä ammattilaiset käyttävät arviointinsa tueksi ja väitteiden todenmukaisuuden todentamiseksi. Tärkeä haaste tilaartikkeleiden käytössä on sellaisten kohtien tunnistaminen, joiden avulla voidaan päätellä väitteen totuudenmukaisuus. Osoitamme, että tarkasteluartikkeleilla koulutetun tiheän läpivientimallin siirtäminen parantaa tilaartikkeleiden läpivientien laatua. Raportoimme tulokset väitteen todenmukaisuuden ennustamiseksi päättelemällä lähtöartikkeleista.', 'ha': "Mu ƙara wani sabo na danna-tsari zuwa aikin jarraba gaskiya farat ɗaya da kake ƙayyade halin algoritori. Ana ƙunsa da daidai (daga hotayar, hotawiki, masu haɗi da mitandai na jamii da da takardar lãbãri), ka kula makala da aka nuna da takardar masu basĩri da kuma masu gabatar da takardar da waɗannan masu shawarar da ke amfani da su dõmin ya ƙarfafa misalin su kuma a gaskata gaskiyar ayukan ayukan su. ... Wani mai muhimu a cikin amfani da sunayen gabatarwa na zama gane na hanya masu hushi da za'a ƙara gaskiyar matsayin. Tuna nuna cewa ka motsa wata motel mai zaman amfani da aka sanar da shi da abubuwa na gyãra tsarin motsi na zaman shawara. . ... Tuna buga mataimaka ga kungiyar kalmar gaskiya daga makala na farko.", 'jv': 'section dataset nganggep pisan (usul karo kalawarta, tarjamahan, media sothik lan artil balesan), ngubah perusahaan oleh nggawe ngupakan ndelok sane perusahaan lan nganggep bantuan sing perusahaan karo nganggep nglanggar oleh operasi sing paling nggo ndelok dhéwé lan ingan langkung weruh nggawe barang langgar. Awak dhéwé sing beraksi kanggo nggambar aturan tapi iki dadi aturan sing beraksi perusahaan seneng nggawe barang nggawe aturan kuwi nggawe aturan sing apik. Awak dhéwé menehi nganggo kuwi model lung ngembugal kuwi tindakan Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngertuakaké perduluran kanggo ngerasah barang nggawe barang nggawe barang.', 'sk': 'Prispevamo nov nabor podatkov za nalogo avtomatiziranega preverjanja dejstev in vrednotenja najsodobnejših algoritmov. Zbirka podatkov vključuje trditve (iz govorov, intervjujev, družbenih medijev in novic), revizijske članke, ki jih objavijo strokovni preverjalci dejstev, in premične članke, ki jih ti strokovni preverjalci dejstev uporabljajo za podporo svojemu pregledu in preverjanju verodostojnosti trditev. Pomemben izziv pri uporabi premičnih člankov je opredelitev ustreznih odlomkov, ki bodo pomagali ugotoviti verodostojnost trditve. Pokazali smo, da prenos modela gostega pridobivanja prehodov, usposobljenega z revizijskimi članki, izboljšuje kakovost pridobivanja prehodov v premičnih člankih. Rezultate za napoved verodostojnosti trditve poročamo s sklepom iz premičnih člankov.', 'he': 'אנחנו תורמים קבוצת נתונים חדשה למשימה של בדיקת עובדות אוטומטית וערכה של אלגוריתמים מצוינים. קבוצת המידע כוללת טענות (מהנאומים, ראיונות, תקשורת חברתית ומאמרי חדשות), מאמרים על ידי מחקרי עובדות מקצועיים ומאמרים על ידי מחקרי עובדות מקצועיים אלה כדי לתמוך בבדיקה שלהם ולאבדוק את האמת של הטענות. אתגר חשוב בשימוש במאמרים המרכזים הוא הזהות של מעברים רלוונטיים שיעזרו למצוא את האמת של טענה. אנו מראים שההעברה של דוגמנית חיפוש מעבר צפוף מאומנת עם מאמרים ביקורת משפר את איכות החיפוש של מעברים במאמרים. אנו מדווחים על תוצאות לחזוי האמת של טענות על ידי תוצאה ממאמרים מראשי.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དངོས་ཐོག་ལས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསར་བ The dataset includes claims (from speeches, interviews, social media and news articles), articles published by professional fact checkers and premise articles used by those professional fact checkers to support their review and verify the veracity of the claims. Premium ཡིག་ཆ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ནང་དུ་གལ་ཆེན་ཅིག་ནི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་གཏོང་ཐུབ ང་ཚོས་དུས་འདས་བའི་བརྒྱུད་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་ཞིག་བྱེད་བཞིན་པའི་ནང་གི་ཚད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱས ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་བ་དེ་དག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Feeding What You Need by Understanding What You Learned', 'ar': 'FrugalScore: تعلم مقاييس تقييم أرخص وأخف وأسرع لإنشاء نص تلقائي', 'es': 'FrugalScore: aprender métricas de evaluación más baratas, ligeras y rápidas para la generación automática de textos', 'pt': 'FrugalScore: aprendendo métricas de avaliação mais baratas, leves e rápidas para geração automática de texto', 'fr': "FrugalScore\xa0: apprendre des mesures d'évaluation moins coûteuses, plus légères et plus rapides pour la génération automatique de texte", 'ja': 'FrugalScore ：自動テキスト生成のためのより安価、より軽く、より高速な評価指標を学習', 'zh': 'FrugalScore曰:学贱、轻、疾指标,以成文也', 'hi': 'मितव्ययीस्कोर: स्वचालित पाठ पीढ़ी के लिए सस्ता, हल्का और तेज़ मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक सीखना', 'ru': 'FrugalScore: Учиться дешевле, легче и быстрее Оценочные показатели для автоматической генерации текста', 'ga': 'FrugalScore: Ag Foghlaim Méadracht Mheastóireachta Níos Saoire, Níos Gile agus níos Tapúla le haghaidh Giniúint Uathoibríoch Téacs', 'ka': 'ფროგრალიაScore: სწავლება ფერი, სინამდვილე და სწრაფად განსაზღვრების მეტრიკი ავტომატური ტექსტის შექმნა', 'hu': 'FrugalScore: Olcsóbb, könnyebb és gyorsabb értékelési mérések tanulása automatikus szöveggeneráláshoz', 'el': 'Μάθηση φτηνότερων, ελαφρύτερων και ταχύτερων μετρήσεων αξιολόγησης για αυτόματη δημιουργία κειμένου', 'mk': 'ФругалScore: Научи поцени, полесни и побрзи метрики за евалуација за генерација автоматски текст', 'it': 'FrugalScore: Imparare metriche di valutazione più economiche, leggere e veloci per la generazione automatica del testo', 'lt': 'FrugalScore: Mokymasis pigesnis, lengvesnis ir greitesnis automatinės teksto gamybos vertinimo metrikas', 'ms': 'FrugalScore: Learning Cheaper, Lighter and Faster Evaluation Metrics for Automatic Text Generation', 'ml': 'ഫ്രൂഗല്\u200dസ്കോര്\u200d: പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ചീപ്പര്\u200d, പെട്ടെന്നും വേഗം Evaluation Metrics for Automatic Text Generation', 'kk': 'Фругаль', 'mt': 'FrugalScore: Tagħlim Metriki ta’ Evalwazzjoni Aħfief u Aħfief għall-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test Awtomatiku', 'mn': 'Фрагугалийн сүлжээ: Автоматик Текст үүсгэх төлөвлөгөөний суралцах, илүү гэрэлтэй, хурдан үнэлэх метрик', 'no': 'FrugalScore: Læring av brikker, lysare og raskare evalueringsmetrikn for automatisk tekstgenerering', 'pl': 'FrugalScore: Uczenie się tańszych, lżejszych i szybszych wskaźników oceny dla automatycznego generowania tekstu', 'ro': 'FrugalScore: Învățarea metricilor de evaluare mai ieftine, mai ușoare și mai rapide pentru generarea automată a textului', 'sr': 'FrugalScore: Učenje zgloba, svetla i brže procjene metrika za automatsku generaciju teksta', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන්: ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පිළිබඳින්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂණ මීටරි', 'so': 'FrugalScore: Learning Cheaper, Lighter and Faster Evaluation Metrics for Automatic Text Generation', 'sv': 'FrugalScore: Att lära sig billigare, lättare och snabbare utvärderingsmetoder för automatisk textgenerering', 'ur': 'فرگوئل اسکور: آٹوٹیکس پیدا کرنے کے لئے چپر، روشنی اور تیز ارزش متریک سکھائی', 'ta': 'முன்னுகல் மதிப்பு', 'uz': 'Score: Learning Cheaper, Lighter and Tez Evaluation Metrics for Automatic Text Generation', 'vi': 'Đánh dấu Nước Đông: Hệ thống Đánh giá rẻ hơn, ánh sáng và nhanh hơn', 'bg': 'Научете по-евтини, по-леки и по-бързи измервания за автоматично генериране на текст', 'da': 'FrugalScore: Læring billigere, lettere og hurtigere evalueringsmålinger for automatisk tekstgenerering', 'nl': 'FrugalScore: goedkopere, lichtere en snellere evaluatiestatistieken leren voor automatische tekstgeneratie', 'hr': 'FrugalScore: Učenje zgloba, lakše i brže procjene metrika za automatsku generaciju teksta', 'de': 'FrugalScore: Billigere, leichtere und schnellere Auswertungskennzahlen für die automatische Texterstellung lernen', 'id': 'FrugalScore: Belajar Metrik Evaluasi Lebih Murah, Lebih Cerah dan Lebih Cepat untuk Generasi Teks Otomatis', 'fa': 'فراوگالScore: Learning Cheaper, Lighter and Faster Evaluation Metrics for Automatic Text Generation', 'ko': 'FrugalScore: 텍스트 자동 생성을 위한 보다 저렴하고 가볍고 빠른 평가 지표 학습', 'sw': 'FrugalScore: Kufundisha Uwezeshaji, Uchunguzi na Uchunguzi wa Rasimu kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Teknolojia', 'af': 'FrugalScore: Onderleer Cheaper, Ligger en Vinniger Evaluering Metrike vir Outomatiese Teks Genereering', 'tr': 'Frugali첵a: 횥첵tge힊ik 철wrenmek, Ha첵al we 횉altylyk Ta첵첵arlama Metrici Awtomatik Metin D철n체힊mesi 체챌in', 'sq': 'FrugalScore: Mësoni Metrikën e vlerësimit më të lirë dhe më të shpejtë për Gjenerimin Automatik të Tekstit', 'am': 'Score: Learning Cheaper, Lighter and Faster Evaluation Metrics for Automatic Text Generation', 'az': 'FraqugalScore: √Ėyr…ônm…ôk √Ėyr…ônm…ôk, AŇüńĪq v…ô HńĪzlńĪ √Ėyr…ônm…ôk Metrici √Ėyr…ônm…ôk', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'ফ্রুগালস্কোর: স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে টেক্সট জেনারেশনের জন্য শিক্ষা শিক্ষা, লাইট এবং দ্রুত মেট্রিক', 'bs': 'FrugalScore: Učenje zgloba, svetla i brže procjene metrika za automatsku generaciju teksta', 'ca': "FrugalScore: Aprendre mètrics d'evaluació més barats, lleugers i ràpids per a la generació automàtica de text", 'cs': 'FrugalScore: Učení levnějších, lehčích a rychlejších hodnotících metrik pro automatické generování textu', 'et': 'FrugalScore: Õppida odavamaid, kergemaid ja kiiremaid hindamismeetreid automaatse teksti genereerimiseks', 'fi': 'FrugalScore: Edullisempien, kevyempien ja nopeampien arviointimetrien oppiminen automaattiseen tekstintuotantoon', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdater', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'FrugalScore: Učenje cenejših, lažjih in hitrejših meril ocenjevanja za samodejno ustvarjanje besedila', 'he': 'FrugalScore: ללמוד מטריקת עריכה גבוהה יותר, קלה יותר ומהירה יותר לייצור טקסט אוטומטי', 'bo': 'FrugalScore: Learning Cheaper, Lighter and Fast Evaluation Metrics for Automatic Text Generation'}
{'en': 'Machine Reading Comprehension MRC reveals the ability to understand a given text passage and answer questions based on it Existing research works in MRC rely heavily on large size models and corpus to improve the performance evaluated by metrics such as Exact Match EM$ and F_1$. However such a paradigm lacks sufficient interpretation to model capability and can not efficiently train a model with a large corpus In this paper we argue that a deep understanding of model capabilities and data properties can help us feed a model with appropriate training data based on its learning status Specifically we design an MRC capability assessment framework that assesses model capabilities in an explainable and multi dimensional manner Based on it we further uncover and disentangle the connections between various data properties and model performance Finally to verify the effectiveness of the proposed MRC capability assessment framework we incorporate it into a curriculum learning pipeline and devise a Capability Boundary Breakthrough Curriculum CBBC strategy which performs a model capability based training to maximize the data value and improve training efficiency Extensive experiments demonstrate that our approach significantly improves performance achieving up to an 11.22\\% 8.71\\% improvement of EM$ F_1 on MRC tasksEM) and F_1. However, such a paradigm lacks sufficient interpretation to model capability and can not efficiently train a model with a large corpus. In this paper, we argue that a deep understanding of model capabilities and data properties can help us feed a model with appropriate training data based on its learning status. Specifically, we design an MRC capability assessment framework that assesses model capabilities in an explainable and multi-dimensional manner. Based on it, we further uncover and disentangle the connections between various data properties and model performance. Finally, to verify the effectiveness of the proposed MRC capability assessment framework, we incorporate it into a curriculum learning pipeline and devise a Capability Boundary Breakthrough Curriculum (CBBC) strategy, which performs a model capability-based training to maximize the data value and improve training efficiency. Extensive experiments demonstrate that our approach significantly improves performance, achieving up to an 11.22% / 8.71% improvement of EM / F_1 on MRC tasks.', 'ar': 'مقاييس التقييم السريعة والموثوقة هي مفتاح تقدم البحث والتطوير. في حين أن مقاييس توليد اللغة الطبيعية التقليدية سريعة ، إلا أنها ليست موثوقة للغاية. وعلى العكس من ذلك ، فإن المقاييس الجديدة المستندة إلى نماذج لغة كبيرة مدربة مسبقًا أكثر موثوقية ، ولكنها تتطلب موارد حسابية كبيرة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح FrugalScore ، وهو نهج لتعلم إصدار ثابت ومنخفض التكلفة لأي مقياس NLG باهظ الثمن ، مع الاحتفاظ بمعظم أدائه الأصلي. تُظهر التجارب مع BERTScore و MoverScore على التلخيص والترجمة أن FrugalScore على قدم المساواة مع المقاييس الأصلية (وأحيانًا أفضل) ، مع وجود عدة أوامر من حيث الحجم أقل من المعلمات وتعمل بشكل أسرع عدة مرات. في المتوسط على جميع المقاييس والمهام والمتغيرات المكتسبة ، تحتفظ FrugalScore بنسبة 96.8٪ من الأداء ، وتعمل أسرع بـ 24 مرة ، وتحتوي على معلمات أقل 35 مرة من المقاييس الأصلية. نجعل مقاييسنا المدربة متاحة للجمهور ، لإفادة مجتمع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية بالكامل وخاصة الباحثين والممارسين ذوي الموارد المحدودة.', 'es': 'Las métricas de evaluación rápidas y fiables son clave para el progreso de la I+D. Si bien las métricas de generación de lenguaje natural tradicionales son rápidas, no son muy fiables. Por el contrario, las nuevas métricas basadas en grandes modelos lingüísticos preentrenados son mucho más fiables, pero requieren importantes recursos computacionales. En este artículo, proponemos FrugalScore, un enfoque para aprender una versión fija y de bajo costo de cualquier métrica de NLG costosa, manteniendo la mayor parte de su rendimiento original. Los experimentos con BertScore y MoverScore sobre resumen y traducción muestran que FrugalScore está a la par con las métricas originales (y a veces mejor), a la vez que tiene varios órdenes de magnitud menos parámetros y funciona varias veces más rápido. En promedio, en todas las métricas, tareas y variantes aprendidas, FrugalScore retiene el 96,8% del rendimiento, funciona 24 veces más rápido y tiene 35 veces menos parámetros que las métricas originales. Ponemos a disposición del público nuestras métricas capacitadas para beneficiar a toda la comunidad de PNL y, en particular, a los investigadores y profesionales con recursos limitados.', 'pt': 'Métricas de avaliação rápidas e confiáveis são fundamentais para o progresso de P&D. Embora as métricas tradicionais de geração de linguagem natural sejam rápidas, elas não são muito confiáveis. Por outro lado, novas métricas baseadas em grandes modelos de linguagem pré-treinados são muito mais confiáveis, mas requerem recursos computacionais significativos. Neste artigo, propomos o FrugalScore, uma abordagem para aprender uma versão fixa e de baixo custo de qualquer métrica NLG cara, mantendo a maior parte de seu desempenho original. Experimentos com BERTScore e MoverScore em sumarização e tradução mostram que o FrugalScore está no mesmo nível das métricas originais (e às vezes melhor), embora tenha várias ordens de magnitude menos parâmetros e seja executado várias vezes mais rápido. Em média, em todas as métricas, tarefas e variantes aprendidas, o FrugalScore retém 96,8% do desempenho, é executado 24 vezes mais rápido e tem 35 vezes menos parâmetros do que as métricas originais. Disponibilizamos publicamente nossas métricas treinadas, para beneficiar toda a comunidade de PNL e, em particular, pesquisadores e profissionais com recursos limitados.', 'fr': "Des mesures d'évaluation rapides et fiables sont essentielles au progrès de la R&D. Bien que les métriques traditionnelles de génération de langage naturel soient rapides, elles ne sont pas très fiables. À l'inverse, les nouvelles métriques basées sur de grands modèles de langage préformés sont beaucoup plus fiables, mais nécessitent des ressources informatiques importantes. Dans cet article, nous proposons FrugalScore, une approche permettant d'apprendre une version fixe et peu coûteuse de toute métrique NLG coûteuse, tout en conservant la plupart de ses performances d'origine. Les expériences avec BertScore et MoverScore sur la synthèse et la traduction montrent que FrugalScore est comparable aux métriques originales (et parfois meilleures), tout en ayant plusieurs ordres de grandeur en moins de paramètres et en fonctionnant plusieurs fois plus vite. En moyenne, sur l'ensemble des métriques, tâches et variantes apprises, FrugalScore conserve 96,8\xa0% des performances, s'exécute 24 fois plus vite et possède 35 fois moins de paramètres que les métriques d'origine. Nous mettons nos métriques formées à la disposition du public, au profit de l'ensemble de la communauté de la PNL et en particulier des chercheurs et des praticiens aux ressources limitées.", 'zh': '速可凭之评指标研发进展之机也。 虽自然语言生指标速,非所恃也。 反此者,大指标之新也,而大计算资源也。 本文有FrugalScore,此学贵NLG指标之常,低成本版本之法,兼存其大体。 用BERTScoreMoverScore总结译实验明,FrugalScore与始指标相当(或更善),参数少数量级,疾行数倍。 平均言之,凡学指标、任变体之中,FrugalScore 存 96.8% 之性,行速倍 24 ,参数倍于始指标 35 。 明我训指标,以利全NLP社区,特为资源有限之人从业者。', 'hi': 'तेजी से और विश्वसनीय मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक आर एंड डी प्रगति के लिए महत्वपूर्ण हैं। जबकि पारंपरिक प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी के मीट्रिक तेज हैं, वे बहुत विश्वसनीय नहीं हैं। इसके विपरीत, बड़े पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के आधार पर नए मीट्रिक बहुत अधिक विश्वसनीय हैं, लेकिन महत्वपूर्ण कम्प्यूटेशनल संसाधनों की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम मितव्ययीस्कोर का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो किसी भी महंगे एनएलजी मीट्रिक के एक निश्चित, कम लागत वाले संस्करण को सीखने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण है, जबकि इसके अधिकांश मूल प्रदर्शन को बनाए रखता है। सारांशीकरण और अनुवाद पर BERTScore और MoverScore के साथ प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि FrugalScore मूल मैट्रिक्स (और कभी-कभी बेहतर) के बराबर है, जबकि परिमाण कम मापदंडों के कई आदेश होते हैं और कई गुना तेजी से चल रहे हैं। सभी सीखा मैट्रिक्स, कार्यों और वेरिएंट पर औसतन, FrugalScore प्रदर्शन का 96.8% बरकरार रखता है, 24 गुना तेजी से चलता है, और मूल मैट्रिक्स की तुलना में 35 गुना कम पैरामीटर है। हम अपने प्रशिक्षित मैट्रिक्स को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराते हैं, पूरे एनएलपी समुदाय और विशेष रूप से सीमित संसाधनों वाले शोधकर्ताओं और चिकित्सकों को लाभान्वित करने के लिए।', 'ru': 'Быстрые и надежные показатели оценки являются ключом к прогрессу НИОКР. Хотя традиционные метрики генерации естественного языка быстры, они не очень надежны. И наоборот, новые метрики, основанные на больших предварительно обученных языковых моделях, гораздо более надежны, но требуют значительных вычислительных ресурсов. В этой статье мы предлагаем FrugalScore, подход к изучению фиксированной, недорогой версии любой дорогой метрики NLG, сохраняя при этом большую часть ее первоначальной производительности. Эксперименты с BERTScore и MoverScore по суммированию и переводу показывают, что FrugalScore находится на одном уровне с исходными метриками (а иногда и лучше), при этом имеет на несколько порядков меньше параметров и работает в несколько раз быстрее. В среднем по всем изученным метрикам, заданиям и вариантам FrugalScore сохраняет 96,8% производительности, работает в 24 раза быстрее и имеет в 35 раз меньше параметров, чем исходные метрики. Мы делаем наши обученные метрики общедоступными, чтобы принести пользу всему сообществу NLP и, в частности, исследователям и практикам с ограниченными ресурсами.', 'ja': '迅速で信頼性の高い評価指標は、研究開発を進めるための鍵です。 従来の自然言語生成メトリックは高速ですが、信頼性はあまり高くありません。 逆に、大規模な事前訓練された言語モデルに基づいた新しい指標は、はるかに信頼性が高いが、多大な計算リソースを必要とする。 この論文では、高価なNLG指標の固定された低コストバージョンを学習するためのアプローチであるFrugalScoreを提案し、その元のパフォーマンスのほとんどを維持します。 BERTScoreとMoverScoreを用いた要約と翻訳の実験では、FrugalScoreは元の指標と同等（時にはより良い）であると同時に、いくつかの桁数のパラメータが少なく、実行速度が数倍速いことが示されています。 学習したすべての指標、タスク、およびバリアントの平均で、FrugalScoreはパフォーマンスの96.8%を保持し、24倍速く実行し、パラメータは元の指標の35倍少ないです。 当社は、NLPコミュニティ全体、特に限られたリソースを持つ研究者や実践者に利益をもたらすために、訓練された指標を公開しています。', 'ga': "Tá méadracht mheastóireachta thapa iontaofa ríthábhachtach do dhul chun cinn T&F. Cé go bhfuil méadrachtaí giniúna teanga nádúrtha traidisiúnta go tapa, níl siad an-iontaofa. Os a choinne sin, tá méadracht nua bunaithe ar mhúnlaí móra teanga réamhoilte i bhfad níos iontaofa, ach teastaíonn acmhainní suntasacha ríomhaireachta. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid FrugalScore, cur chuige chun leagan seasta, ar chostas íseal d'aon mhéadrach NLG daor a fhoghlaim, agus an chuid is mó dá fheidhmíocht bhunaidh á choinneáil ag an am céanna. Léiríonn turgnaimh le BERTScore agus MoverScore ar achoimriú agus aistriúchán go bhfuil FrugalScore ar chomhchéim leis na bunmhéadracht (agus uaireanta níos fearr), cé go bhfuil roinnt orduithe méide níos lú paraiméadair aige agus go n-imíonn sé arís agus arís eile níos tapúla. Ar an meán thar gach méadracht, tascanna agus malairtí foghlamtha, coimeádann FrugalScore 96.8% den fheidhmíocht, ritheann sé 24 huaire níos tapúla, agus tá 35 uair níos lú paraiméadair aige ná an bunmhéadracht. Cuirimid ár méadracht oilte ar fáil don phobal, chun leas an phobail NLP ar fad agus go háirithe taighdeoirí agus cleachtóirí a bhfuil acmhainní teoranta acu.", 'el': 'Οι γρήγορες και αξιόπιστες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης είναι το κλειδί για την πρόοδο Ε&Α. Ενώ οι παραδοσιακές μετρήσεις παραγωγής φυσικής γλώσσας είναι γρήγορες, δεν είναι πολύ αξιόπιστες. Αντίθετα, οι νέες μετρήσεις που βασίζονται σε μεγάλα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα είναι πολύ πιο αξιόπιστες, αλλά απαιτούν σημαντικούς υπολογιστικούς πόρους. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση για να μάθετε μια σταθερή, χαμηλού κόστους έκδοση οποιασδήποτε ακριβής μετρικής, διατηρώντας το μεγαλύτερο μέρος της αρχικής απόδοσής της. Τα πειράματα με τη σύνοψη και τη μετάφραση δείχνουν ότι το FrugalScore είναι στο ίδιο επίπεδο με τις αρχικές μετρήσεις (και μερικές φορές καλύτερη), ενώ έχει αρκετές τάξεις μεγέθους λιγότερες παραμέτρους και τρέχει αρκετές φορές γρηγορότερα. Κατά μέσο όρο σε όλες τις μαθημένες μετρήσεις, εργασίες και παραλλαγές, το διατηρεί 96,8% της απόδοσης, εκτελείται 24-φορές γρηγορότερα και έχει 35-φορές λιγότερες παραμέτρους από τις αρχικές μετρήσεις. Κάνουμε τις εκπαιδευμένες μετρήσεις μας διαθέσιμες στο κοινό, προς όφελος ολόκληρης της κοινότητας και ειδικότερα των ερευνητών και των επαγγελματιών με περιορισμένους πόρους.', 'hu': 'A gyors és megbízható értékelési mutatók kulcsfontosságúak a K+F fejlődéséhez. Bár a hagyományos természetes nyelv generálási mutatók gyorsak, nem túl megbízhatóak. Ezzel szemben a nagyméretű, előkészített nyelvi modelleken alapuló új mutatók sokkal megbízhatóbbak, de jelentős számítási erőforrásokat igényelnek. Ebben a tanulmányban a FrugalScore megközelítést javasoljuk, hogy megtanulják a drága NLG metrika fix, olcsó verzióját, miközben megtartják eredeti teljesítményének nagy részét. A BERTScore és MoverScore összefoglalással és fordítással végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a FrugalScore egyenlő az eredeti mutatókkal (és néha jobb), miközben több nagyságrenddel kevesebb paraméterrel rendelkezik és többször gyorsabban fut. Átlagosan az összes tanult mutató, feladat és változat esetében a FrugalScore megtartja a teljesítmény 96,8%-át, 24-szer gyorsabban fut, és 35-szer kevesebb paramétert tartalmaz, mint az eredeti mutatók. Képzett mutatóinkat nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé tesszük, hogy az egész NLP közösség és különösen a korlátozott erőforrásokkal rendelkező kutatók és szakemberek számára előnyös legyen.', 'ka': 'სწრაფად და დარწმუნებელი განსაზღვრების მეტრიკები არის პროგრესის გასაღები. თუმცა ტრადიციონალური ენერგიის წარმოდგენის მეტრიკი ძალიან ბრძნელია, მათ არ არის ძალიან დარწმუნელია. შეცდომად, ახალი მეტრიკები დიდი წინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინა, მაგრამ უნდა უფრო დარწმუნდება, მაგრამ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ FraugalScore-ს წყველას, რომელიც დავისწავლოთ განსაკუთრებული, მარტივი განსაკუთრებული NLG მეტრიკის ვერსია, რომელიც უფრო მეტრიკური განსაკუთრებულია. BERTScore- ის და MoverScore- ის გამოცდილებები ჩვენებს, რომ FrugalScore- ს პირველ მეტრიკის (და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად საშუალოდ ყველა მოსწავლილი მეტრიკა, დავალებები და განრამეტრებების განმავლობაში, ფრაგრალური სკენტის 96.8% უკვე მუშაობს, 24-ჯერ უფრო სიჩქარე და 35-ჯერ უფრო პარამეტრები უფ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ჩვენი მეტრიკის ადგილურად ხელსახულება, რომ გავიყენოთ უფრო საზოგადოება NLP და განსაკუთრებით მსწავლობელი და პრაქტიკონტებელი, რომლებ', 'it': "Le metriche di valutazione rapide e affidabili sono fondamentali per il progresso della R&S. Mentre le metriche tradizionali di generazione del linguaggio naturale sono veloci, non sono molto affidabili. Al contrario, le nuove metriche basate su grandi modelli linguistici pre-addestrati sono molto più affidabili, ma richiedono risorse computazionali significative. In questo articolo, proponiamo FrugalScore, un approccio per imparare una versione fissa e a basso costo di qualsiasi metrica NLG costosa, pur mantenendo la maggior parte delle sue prestazioni originali. Gli esperimenti con BERTScore e MoverScore sulla sintesi e traduzione mostrano che FrugalScore è alla pari con le metriche originali (e talvolta migliori), pur avendo diversi ordini di grandezza in meno di parametri e correndo diverse volte più velocemente. In media, su tutte le metriche, attività e varianti apprese, FrugalScore mantiene il 96,8% delle prestazioni, esegue 24 volte più velocemente e ha 35 volte meno parametri rispetto alle metriche originali. Rendiamo disponibili pubblicamente le nostre metriche addestrate, a beneficio dell'intera comunità PNL e in particolare dei ricercatori e professionisti con risorse limitate.", 'lt': 'Siekiant MTTP pažangos labai svarbūs greiti ir patikimi vertinimo rodikliai. Nors tradicinės natūralios kalbos generacijos metrijos yra greitos, jos nėra labai patikimos. Priešingai, nauji rodikliai, pagrįsti dideliais išankstinio mokymo kalbų modeliais, yra daug patikimesni, tačiau reikalingi dideli skaičiavimo ištekliai. Šiame dokumente siūlome FrugalScore, metodą mokytis fiksuotos ir mažos kainos bet kokios brangios NLG metrijos versijos, kartu išlaikant didžiąją jos pradinės veiklos dalį. Eksperimentai su BERTScore ir MoverScore santraukos ir vertimo klausimais rodo, kad FrugalScore yra lygiavertė pradiniams metriniams rodikliams (ir kartais geresniems), o kai kurie dydžio eilučiai mažesni ir kelis kartus greitesni. Vidutiniškai visose išmokytose metrijose, užduotyse ir variantuose FrugalScore išlieka 96,8 % veiklos rezultatų, veikia 24 kartus greičiau ir turi 35 kartus mažiau parametrų nei pradinis rodiklis. Mes viešai paskelbiame savo apmokytus rodiklius, kad būtų naudinga visai NLP bendruomenei, ypač ribotų išteklių turintiems mokslininkams ir praktikantams.', 'mk': 'Fast and reliable evaluation metrics are key to R&D progress.  Иако традиционалните метрики за генерација на природен јазик се брзи, тие не се многу доверливи. Напротив, новите метрики базирани на големи предобучени јазички модели се многу подоверливи, но бараат значителни компјутативни ресурси. In this paper, we propose FrugalScore, an approach to learn a fixed, low cost version of any expensive NLG metric, while retaining most of its original performance.  Експериментите со BERTScore и MoverScore за резултат и превод покажуваат дека FrugalScore е во рамка со оригиналните метрики (и понекогаш подобри), додека има неколку редови со големина помалку параметри и работи неколку пати побрзо. Во просек за сите научени метрики, задачи и варијанти, FrugalScore задржува 96,8 отсто од перформансата, работи 24 пати побрзо и има 35 пати помалку параметри од оригиналните метрики. Ја обезбедуваме нашата обучена метрика јавно, за да ја користиме целата заедница на НЛП и особено истражувачите и практиките со ограничени ресурси.', 'kk': 'Тез және сенімді оқу метрикалары - R&D прогрессиясының кілті. Тәуелдік тілді жасау метрикасы жылдам болғанда, олар өте сенімді емес. Осымен қатар, үлкен тіл үлгілеріне негізделген жаңа метрикалар көп сенімді, бірақ есептеу ресурстарын талап етеді. Бұл қағазда Фругальскор дегенді ұсынамыз, NLG метрикалық көпшілігін сақтау үшін бағатты, төмен бағатты нұсқасының көпшілігін оқыту арқылы. BERTScore және MoverScore тұжырымдамасы және аудармасындағы тәжірибелер FrugalScore бастапқы метрикалық (және кейбірде жақсы) параметрлердің бірнеше реті жоғары және бірнеше рет жылдамасыз жүргізілген екенін көр Барлық үйренген метрикалық, тапсырмалар және варианттардың орташасында ФругальзScore жылдамдығының 96,8% дегенді сақтайды, 24 рет жылдам жүреді және бастапқы метрикадан 35 рет аз параметрлері бар. Біз оқылған метрикаларымызды жалпы жеткізу үшін, барлық NLP қоғамдарына және осымен қатар зерттеушілерімізді және тәжірибелерімізді шектелген ресурстар бар.', 'mt': 'Il-metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni mgħaġġla u affidabbli huma kruċjali għall-progress fir-R&D. Filwaqt li l-metriċi tradizzjonali tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali huma mgħaġġla, mhumiex affidabbli ħafna. Għall-kuntrarju, metriċi ġodda bbażati fuq mudelli kbar ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel huma ħafna aktar affidabbli, iżda jeħtieġu riżorsi komputattivi sinifikanti. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu FrugalScore, approċċ biex titgħallem verżjoni fissa u bi prezz baxx ta’ kwalunkwe metrika NLG għalja, filwaqt li nżammu l-biċċa l-kbira tal-prestazzjoni oriġinali tagħha. L-esperimenti b’BERTScore u MoverScore dwar is-sommarju u t-traduzzjoni juru li FrugalScore huwa ugwali għall-metriċi oriġinali (u xi kultant aħjar), filwaqt li għandu diversi ordnijiet ta’ daqs inqas parametri u jaħdem diversi drabi aktar malajr. Bħala medja fuq il-metriċi, il-kompiti u l-varjanti kollha mitgħallma, FrugalScore jżomm 96.8% tal-prestazzjoni, jaħdem 24 darba aktar malajr, u għandu 35 darba inqas parametri mill-metriċi oriġinali. We make our trained metrics publicly available, to benefit the entire NLP community and in particular researchers and practitioners with limited resources.', 'ms': 'Metrik penilaian yang pantas dan boleh dipercayai adalah kunci untuk kemajuan R&D. Meskipun metrik generasi bahasa biasa tradisional adalah cepat, ia tidak sangat dipercayai. Sebaliknya, metrik baru berdasarkan model bahasa besar yang dilatih dahulu jauh lebih dipercayai, tetapi memerlukan sumber pengiraan yang signifikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan FrugalScore, pendekatan untuk belajar versi tertentu, dengan harga rendah dari mana-mana metrik mahal NLG, sementara menyimpan kebanyakan prestasi asalnya. Eksperimen dengan BERTScore dan MoverScore pada ringkasan dan terjemahan menunjukkan bahawa FrugalScore adalah sama dengan metrik asal (dan kadang-kadang lebih baik), sementara mempunyai beberapa arahan ukuran kurang parameter dan berjalan beberapa kali lebih cepat. Secara rata-rata atas semua metrik, tugas, dan varian belajar, FrugalScore menyimpan 96.8% prestasi, berjalan 24 kali lebih cepat, dan mempunyai 35 kali kurang parameter daripada metrik asal. Kami membuat metrik terlatih kami tersedia kepada masyarakat, untuk memberi manfaat kepada seluruh komuniti NLP dan khususnya penyelidik dan praktek dengan sumber terbatas.', 'ml': 'വേഗത്തിലും വിശ്വസ്തനായ വിലാസപുലര്\u200dത്തുന്ന മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d R&D പ്രോഗത്തിന്റെ താക്കോലാണ്. സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ തലമുറകള്\u200d വേഗത്തിലാണെങ്കില്\u200d അത് വളരെ വിശ്വസ്തനാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട്, വലിയ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പുതിയ മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d വളരെ വിശ്വസ്തനാണ്, പക്ഷെ കൂടുതല്\u200d കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഫ്രൂഗല്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d പരിപാടി ചെയ്യുന്നു, നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട, കുറച്ച് വിലയുള്ള എംഎല്\u200dജി മെട്രിക്കിന്\u200dറെ വിലയു ബെര്\u200dട്ടിസ്കോരും മോവെര്\u200dസ്കോരും കൊണ്ടുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഫ്രൂഗല്\u200dസ്കോര്\u200d ആദ്യമായ മെറ്റിക്കളുമായിരിക്കുന്നു (ചിലപ പഠിച്ച എല്ലാ മെട്രിക്കുകളിലും ജോലികളിലും മാറ്റങ്ങളിലും, ഫ്രൂഗല്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d 96. 8% വേഗത്തില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു, 24 തവണ വേഗത്തില്\u200d  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരിശീലന മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവികമാക്കുന്നു, എല്ലാ NLP സമൂഹത്തെയും പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പരിശീലന്മാരെയും പരി', 'pl': 'Szybkie i niezawodne wskaźniki oceny są kluczem do postępu w badaniach i rozwoju. Chociaż tradycyjne wskaźniki generowania języka naturalnego są szybkie, nie są zbyt wiarygodne. Z drugiej strony, nowe wskaźniki oparte na dużych wstępnie przeszkolonych modelach językowych są znacznie bardziej niezawodne, ale wymagają znacznych zasobów obliczeniowych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy FrugalScore, podejście do nauki stałej, niskiej wersji dowolnej drogiej metryki NLG, przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu większości jej oryginalnej wydajności. Eksperymenty z BERTScore i MoverScore dotyczące podsumowania i tłumaczenia pokazują, że FrugalScore jest na równi z oryginalnymi wskaźnikami (a czasem lepszymi), a jednocześnie ma kilka rzędów wielkości mniejsze parametry i działa kilka razy szybciej. Średnio w przypadku wszystkich nauczonych wskaźników, zadań i wariantów FrugalScore zachowuje 96,8% wydajności, działa 24-krotnie szybciej i ma 35-krotnie mniej parametrów niż oryginalne wskaźniki. Nasze przeszkolone wskaźniki udostępniamy publicznie, aby korzystać całej społeczności NLP, a w szczególności naukowców i praktyków z ograniczonymi zasobami.', 'mn': 'Хурдан, итгэлтэй үнэлгээний метрик нь R&D хөгжлийн ач холбогдол юм. Хэдийгээр уламжлалтай байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний метрик хурдан байдаг ч тэд маш итгэлтэй биш. Ялангуяа, том хэл загваруудын үндсэн шинэ метрик нь илүү итгэлтэй, гэхдээ маш чухал тооцоололтын боловсрол хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Фроугалийн Скор-г сурах арга зам нь үнэтэй НLG метрийн үнэтэй, бага үнэтэй хувилбарыг санал болгож байна. BERTScore болон MoverScore-ын туршилтууд жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүд болон орчуулалтын тухай Фругаль-Скор нь эхний метрикийн (заримдаа илүү сайн) хэмжээсүүдийг багасгаж, хэдэн удаа хурдан ажиллаж байгааг харуулдаг. Дунд нь бүх сурсан метрик, үйл ажиллагаа, өөрчлөлтүүдийн дундаж Фруугалийн Score үйл ажиллагааны 96.8% нь илүү хурдан ажилладаг ба эхний метрикээс 35 дахин бага параметр ажилладаг. Бид сургалтын метрикийг олон нийтэд ашиглаж, NLP нийгэмд, ялангуяа судлаачид, ажиллаачид хязгаарлагдсан нөөцийг ашиглах боломжтой болгодог.', 'ro': 'Valorile rapide și fiabile de evaluare sunt esențiale pentru progresul cercetării și dezvoltării. În timp ce valorile tradiționale de generare a limbajului natural sunt rapide, ele nu sunt foarte fiabile. Pe de altă parte, noile măsurători bazate pe modele mari de limbă pre-instruite sunt mult mai fiabile, dar necesită resurse computaționale semnificative. În această lucrare, vă propunem FrugalScore, o abordare pentru a învăța o versiune fixă, low cost a oricărei metrice NLG scumpe, păstrând în același timp cea mai mare parte a performanței sale originale. Experimentele cu BERTScore și MoverScore pe rezumat și traducere arată că FrugalScore este la egalitate cu valorile originale (și uneori mai bune), având în același timp mai puțini parametri de câteva ordine de mărime și rulând de câteva ori mai rapid. În medie, peste toate măsurătorile, sarcinile și variantele învățate, FrugalScore păstrează 96,8% din performanță, rulează de 24 de ori mai rapid și are de 35 de ori mai puțini parametri decât măsurătorile originale. Punem la dispoziția publicului măsurătorile noastre instruite, pentru a beneficia întreaga comunitate PNL și, în special, cercetătorii și practicienii cu resurse limitate.', 'no': 'Snøgt og tiltruleg evalueringsmetrikar er nøkkel for R&D-framgang. Mens det tradisjonelle naturspråk-genereringsmetrikar er rask, er dei ikkje veldig tiltrulige. Sammenlignet er nye metrikar basert på store språk- modeller mykje betre, men krev signifikante dataressursar. I denne papiret foreslår vi FrugalScore, ein tilnærming til å lære eit fast, låg kostnad versjon av alle kostnadsverdiane NLG-metriske, mens det beholder dei fleste originale utviklingane. Eksperimentar med BERTScore og MoverScore on summarization and translation show that FrugalScore is on par with the original metrics (and sometimes better), while having several orders of magnitude less parameters and running several times faster. Gjennomsnittlig over alle lærte metrikar, oppgåver og variantar inneheld FrugalScore 96,8 % av utviklinga, køyrer 24 ganger raskare, og har 35 ganger mindre parametra enn opprinnelige metrikar. Vi gjer våre trengte metrikar offentlig tilgjengeleg for å forbetra heile NLP-samfunnet og spesielt forskere og praktisere med begrensede ressursar.', 'sr': 'Brza i pouzdana procjena metrika su ključna za napredak istraživanja i razvoj. Dok su tradicionalna prirodna generacija jezika brza, nisu baš pouzdane. U suprotnom, nove metrike bazirane na velikim jezičkim modelima su mnogo pouzdaniji, ali zahtevaju značajne računalne resurse. U ovom papiru predlažemo FrugalScore, pristup da naučimo fiksnu, nisku koštanu verziju svake skupe NLG metrike, dok držimo većinu njegovih originalnih izvora. Eksperimenti sa BERTScore i MoverScore o sažetivanju i prevodu pokazuju da je FrugalScore na par sa originalnim metrikama (i ponekad boljem), dok ima nekoliko naređenja manjih parametara veličine i trčanja nekoliko puta brže. U prosjeku preko svih naučenih metrika, zadataka i varianta, FrugalScore zadržava 96,8% učinka, trči 24 puta brže i ima 35 puta manje parametre od originalne metrike. Obučavamo našu obučenu metriku javno dostupnu, da bi koristili cijelu zajednicu NLP, a posebno istraživače i praktičari sa ograničenim resursima.', 'sv': 'Snabb och tillförlitlig utvärdering är nyckeln till FoU-framsteg. Även om traditionella mätvärden för generering av naturligt språk är snabba är de inte särskilt tillförlitliga. Omvänt är nya mätvärden baserade på stora förkränade språkmodeller mycket mer tillförlitliga, men kräver betydande beräkningsresurser. I denna uppsats föreslår vi FrugalScore, ett tillvägagångssätt för att lära sig en fast, låg kostnad version av alla dyra NLG-mått, samtidigt som de behåller det mesta av sin ursprungliga prestanda. Experiment med BERTScore och MoverScore på sammanfattning och översättning visar att FrugalScore är i nivå med de ursprungliga mätvärdena (och ibland bättre), samtidigt som de har flera storleksordningar färre parametrar och körs flera gånger snabbare. FrugalScore behåller i genomsnitt 96,8% av prestandan över alla lärda mätvärden, uppgifter och varianter, körs 24 gånger snabbare och har 35 gånger färre parametrar än de ursprungliga mätvärdena. Vi gör våra utbildade mätvärden tillgängliga för allmänheten, för att gynna hela NLP-gemenskapen och i synnerhet forskare och praktiker med begränsade resurser.', 'si': 'වේගය හා විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ R&D ප්\u200dරධානයේ යත සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවාධික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වේගයි, ඔවුන් ගොඩක් විශ්වාස කරන්න බෑ. වෙනස් වෙනස්, ලොකු ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ස් භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් විශ්වාසයි, නමුත් විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක සම්බන් මේ පත්තරේ අපි ෆ්\u200dරූගල්ස්කෝර් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, ස්ථිර, අඩුම විශේෂ අවස්ථානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්ම BERTScore සහ moverScore සමඟ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ෆ්\u200dරුගලස්කෝර් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරධාන මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් සමඟ හොඳයි, ස සියළු ඉගෙන ගත්ත මෙට්\u200dරික්ස්, වැඩක් හා වෙනස් වලින්, ෆ්\u200dරුගල්ස්කෝර් ප්\u200dරමාණයේ 96.8% තියෙනවා, 24 වතාවක් වේගයෙන් දුවනවා, ඒ වගේ අපි අපේ පුහුණුවන් මෙට්\u200dරික් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, සම්පූර්ණ NLP සමාජයෙන් සහ විශේෂ පරීක්ෂකයෝ', 'so': 'Inta lagu qiimeeyo oo lagu aamin karo, waxay u furan yihiin horumarka R&D. Inta qarniga afka dabiicadda ah ay u dhaqdhaqaaqaan, ma aamin karaan aad. Inta kale, qaababka cusub oo ku saleysan qaababka luuqada oo waaweyn ee la soo daayay waa mid aad u aamin badan, laakiin waxay u baahan yihiin hanti aad u badan ee xisaabta. Warqadan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa FrugalScore, qaab a an ku barno warqad adag oo kharash ah oo qiimo yar oo ah metric kasta oo qaali ah oo NLG ah, iyadoo aad u sii haysato sameynta farsamadiisii hore. Imtixaanka with BERTScore and MoverScore on summarization and translation shows that FrugalScore is on par with the original metrics (and sometimes better), while having several orders to do less parameters and running several times faster. Inta ugu badnaan waxyaabaha la bartay oo dhan, shaqooyinka iyo kala duwan, FrugalScore wuxuu haystaa 96.8% tababarka, wuxuuna ku socotaa 24 jeer oo dhaqso ah, wuxuuna leeyahay 35 jeer ka yar tiraam asalka ah. Waxaynu si bayaan ah u isticmaalnaa metriciyada tababarida, si aan u faa’iido u helno bulshada NLP oo dhan, gaar ahaan cilmi-baarayaasha iyo shaqo-bixiyayaasha oo ay ku haystaan maalmo xad leh.', 'ta': 'வேகமாக மற்றும் நம்பிக்கைக்கூடிய மதிப்பு மெட்ரிக்கள் R&D முன்னேற்றத்திற்கு விசை பாரம்பரிய இயல்பான மொழி தலைமுறைகள் வேகமாக இருக்கும் போது, அவர்கள் மிகவும் நம்பிக்கையில்லை. அதாவது, பெரிய மொழி மாதிரிகளை அடிப்படையில் புதிய மெட்ரிக்கள் மிகவும் நம்பிக்கையாக இருக்கின்றன, ஆனால் கணக்கீட்டு வளங இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் FrugalScore, ஒரு சரியான, குறைந்த செலவு விலை NLG மெட்ரிக்கு கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு வழிமுறையை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அத BERTScore மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மதிப்பெண்களுடன் பரிசோதனைகள் சுருக்கும் மற்றும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் முதல் மெட்ரிக்குகளுடன் இருக்கிறது என்று காட்டுகிறது, சில எல்லா கற்றப்பட்ட மெட்ரிக்களிலும், பணிகள் மற்றும் மாறிகளிலும் சராசரியாக, ஃப்ருகால் செயல்பாட்டின் 96.8% வைத்துக் கொள்கிறது, 24 முறை வேகமாக இயங்கு நாம் எங்கள் பயிற்சி மெட்ரிக்களை பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும், அனைத்து NLP சமூகத்திற்கும் குறிப்பாக ஆராய்ச்சி மற்றும் செ', 'ur': 'سرعت اور قابل تحقیقات متریک R&D پرمختګ کے لئے کلی ہیں. حالانکہ سنتی طبیعی زبان کی نسل متریک تیز ہیں، وہ بہت قابل نہیں ہیں۔ بغیر اس کے، بہت زیادہ زیادہ اعتماد رکھنے والی زبان کی مدلکوں پر بنیاد رکھنے والی نیا متریک ہے، لیکن اہم کامپیوتر کی موجودات کی ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم فرگوئل اسکور کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک طریقہ جو ہر گرانہ NLG متریک کے مطابق مضبوط اور کم قیمت کا نسخہ سیکھنے کے لئے ہے، اور اس کی اکثریت اصلی عملکرد کو حفظ کرتے ہیں. BERTScore اور MoverScore کے ذریعہ تجربے کی تعریف اور ترجمہ کے بارے میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ FrugalScore اصلی متریک (اور بعض اوقات بہتر) کے ساتھ پار ہے، حالانکہ بہت سے اندازے کم پارامتر ہیں اور بہت سے دفعہ چلتے ہیں۔ تمام تعلیم متریک، تاسکیوں اور متفاوتوں کے متوسط پر فرگوئل اسکور کے 96.8% کو روک رہا ہے، 24 دفعہ زیادہ سریع چلتا ہے، اور 35 دفعہ کم پارامیٹر ہیں اصلی متریک سے۔ ہم نے اپنی آموزش کی متریک کو ظاہر طور پر موجود بنایا ہے کہ تمام NLP کمونٹیوں کو فائدہ پہنچائیں اور مخصوص تحقیقات کرنے والوں اور کارگردان کو محدود منبع سے فائدہ پہنچائیں۔', 'vi': "Tính to án đánh giá nhanh và đáng tin cậy là chìa khóa cho tiến trình nghiên cứu. Trong khi đo ngôn ngữ tự nhiên truyền thống nhanh, nhưng chúng không đáng tin cậy lắm. Ngược lại, các thước đo mới dựa trên các mô hình ngôn ngữ lớn được xem là đáng tin cậy hơn, nhưng cần nguồn tính toán quan trọng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị FrugarolScore, một cách tiếp cận để học một phiên bản cố định, rẻ tiền của bất cứ thước đo chính xác nào của NLG, và giữ lại hầu hết các thành quả gốc của nó. Nghiên cứu qua qua qua BERTSCORE... về việc tổng kết và dịch chuyển... cho thấy Fruugal Score giống với âm lượng gốc (và đôi khi tốt hơn), trong khi có nhiều thứ về kích thước ít tham số hơn và chạy nhiều lần nhanh hơn. Trên trung bình, trên tất cả các âm lượng học, các công việc và biến thể, Fruugal Score vẫn giữ được 96.8='của vai, chạy nhanh hơn 24h lần, và có gấp 35 lần các tham số hơn âm lượng gốc. Chúng tôi công khai những âm lượng được đào tạo đó, có ích cho to àn bộ cộng đồng Njala, và nhất là các nhà nghiên cứu và bác sĩ có nguồn lực hạn chế.", 'uz': "Tez va ishlatiladigan qiymati metriklari R&D jarayonini tugmasi. Aslida tabiiy tilning avval metriklari tez bo'lganda, ular juda ishonch emas. Ko'pchilik tilning modellari asosida yangi metriklar juda ham ishlayotgan, lekin muhim kompyuterga murakkab rasmlar kerak. Bu hujjatda, biz FrugalScore'ni o'rganish uchun juda qiymati NLG metrikining qiymati, qiymati chegara versiyasini o'rganish usulni tahrirlash imkoniyat qilamiz, lekin biz ko'pchilik asl vazifasini davom etishni davom etaymiz. Hisobotlar va tarjima qilishda BERTScore va MoverScore bilan imtiyozlar koʻrsatiladi FrugalScore asl metrikalar bilan parcha (va iblantirishda yaxshi) va bir necha tartib parametrlarni kattalashtirish va bir necha marta tez ishlaydi. Oddi barcha o'rganilgan metriclar, vazifalar, va variantlar soni 96.8% bajaradi, 24 marta tez bajaradi va asl metriklardan 35 marta qisqa parametrlar bor. Biz barcha NLP jamiyatlariga, hususika taʼminlovchilar va taʼminlovchilar qo'llanmalar bilan cheksiz rasmlar bilan ishlaydimiz.", 'da': 'Hurtige og pålidelige evalueringsmålinger er nøglen til F&U-fremskridt. Mens traditionelle målinger for generering af naturligt sprog er hurtige, er de ikke særlig pålidelige. Omvendt er nye målinger baseret på store prætrænede sprogmodeller langt mere pålidelige, men kræver betydelige beregningsressourcer. I denne artikel foreslår vi FrugalScore, en tilgang til at lære en fast, lavpris version af enhver dyr NLG metric, samtidig med at de bevarer det meste af sin oprindelige ydeevne. Eksperimenter med BERTScore og MoverScore på opsummering og oversættelse viser, at FrugalScore er på niveau med de oprindelige målinger (og nogle gange bedre), samtidig med at der er flere størrelsesordener færre parametre og kører flere gange hurtigere. FrugalScore bevarer i gennemsnit 96,8% af ydelsen over alle lærte målinger, opgaver og varianter, kører 24 gange hurtigere og har 35 gange færre parametre end de oprindelige målinger. Vi gør vores uddannede målinger offentligt tilgængelige for at gavne hele NLP-fællesskabet og især forskere og praktikere med begrænsede ressourcer.', 'nl': 'Snelle en betrouwbare evaluatiestatistieken zijn essentieel voor de voortgang van R&D. Hoewel traditionele statistieken voor het genereren van natuurlijke talen snel zijn, zijn ze niet erg betrouwbaar. Omgekeerd zijn nieuwe metrics gebaseerd op grote vooraf getrainde taalmodellen veel betrouwbaarder, maar vereisen aanzienlijke rekenmiddelen. In dit artikel stellen we FrugalScore voor, een aanpak om een vaste, goedkope versie van een dure NLG-metric te leren, terwijl het grootste deel van de oorspronkelijke prestaties behouden blijft. Experimenten met BERTScore en MoverScore op samenvatting en vertaling tonen aan dat FrugalScore op gelijke voet staat met de oorspronkelijke metrics (en soms beter), terwijl ze meerdere ordes van grootte minder parameters heeft en meerdere malen sneller werkt. Gemiddeld over alle geleerde metrics, taken en varianten behoudt FrugalScore 96,8% van de prestaties, loopt 24-maal sneller en heeft 35-maal minder parameters dan de oorspronkelijke metrics. We stellen onze getrainde statistieken openbaar beschikbaar, ten bate van de hele NLP-gemeenschap en in het bijzonder onderzoekers en beoefenaars met beperkte middelen.', 'bg': 'Бързите и надеждни показатели за оценка са ключови за напредъка в научноизследователската и развойната дейност. Въпреки че традиционните показатели за генериране на естествен език са бързи, те не са много надеждни. Обратно, новите показатели, базирани на големи предварително обучени езикови модели, са много по-надеждни, но изискват значителни изчислителни ресурси. В тази статия предлагаме подход за изучаване на фиксирана, ниска цена версия на всеки скъп метрик, като същевременно запазваме по-голямата част от първоначалното си представяне. Експериментите за обобщаване и превод показват, че Фругалскор е равен на оригиналните показатели (и понякога по-добър), като същевременно има няколко порции по-малко параметри и работи няколко пъти по-бързо. Средно за всички научени показатели, задачи и варианти запазва 96,8% от ефективността, работи 24 пъти по-бързо и има 35 пъти по-малко параметри от първоначалните показатели. Ние правим нашите обучени показатели публично достъпни, за да бъдат от полза за цялата общност на НЛП и по-специално изследователи и практикуващи с ограничени ресурси.', 'de': 'Schnelle und zuverlässige Bewertungskennzahlen sind der Schlüssel zum Fortschritt in Forschung und Entwicklung. Während traditionelle Metriken zur Generierung natürlicher Sprache schnell sind, sind sie nicht sehr zuverlässig. Umgekehrt sind neue Metriken, die auf großen vortrainierten Sprachmodellen basieren, viel zuverlässiger, erfordern aber erhebliche Rechenressourcen. In diesem Artikel schlagen wir FrugalScore vor, einen Ansatz, um eine feste, kostengünstige Version jeder teuren NLG-Metrik zu erlernen, während der Großteil ihrer ursprünglichen Leistung beibehalten wird. Experimente mit BERTScore und MoverScore zur Zusammenfassung und Übersetzung zeigen, dass FrugalScore mit den ursprünglichen Metriken (und manchmal besser) auf Augenhöhe ist, mehrere Größenordnungen weniger Parameter hat und um ein Vielfaches schneller läuft. FrugalScore behält durchschnittlich 96,8% der Leistung bei, läuft 24-mal schneller und hat 35-mal weniger Parameter als die ursprünglichen Metriken. Wir stellen unsere geschulten Metriken öffentlich zur Verfügung, um der gesamten NLP-Community und insbesondere Forschern und Praktikern mit begrenzten Ressourcen zu dienen.', 'hr': 'Brza i pouzdana procjena metrika su ključna za napredak istraživanja i razvoj. Iako su tradicionalne prirodne jezičke generacije metrike brze, nisu baš pouzdane. U suprotnom, nove metrike bazirane na velikim jezičkim modelima su mnogo pouzdaniji, ali zahtijevaju značajne računalne resurse. U ovom papiru predlažemo FrugalScore, pristup naučiti određenu, nisku koštanu verziju svake skupe NLG metrike, dok držimo većinu njegovih originalnih izvora. Eksperimenti s BERTScore i MoverScore o sažetivanju i prevodu pokazuju da je FrugalScore na par s originalnim metrikama (i ponekad boljem), dok ima nekoliko naređenja manjih parametara veličine i radi nekoliko puta brže. U prosjeku iznad svih naučenih metrika, zadataka i varianta, FrugalScore zadržava 96,8% učinka, trči 24 puta brže i ima 35 puta manje parametre od originalne metrike. Naše obučene metrike javno činimo dostupnim, kako bi koristili cijelu zajednicu NLP-a, posebno istraživače i praktičari s ograničenim resursima.', 'id': 'Metrik evaluasi yang cepat dan dapat dipercaya adalah kunci untuk kemajuan R&D. Meskipun metrik generasi bahasa alami tradisional cepat, mereka tidak sangat dipercaya. Sebaliknya, metrik baru berdasarkan model bahasa besar yang dilatih sebelumnya jauh lebih dipercaya, tetapi membutuhkan sumber komputasi yang signifikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan FrugalScore, pendekatan untuk belajar versi fiks, mahal rendah dari metrik mahal NLG, sementara mempertahankan kebanyakan prestasi aslinya. Eksperimen dengan BERTScore dan MoverScore pada ringkasan dan terjemahan menunjukkan bahwa FrugalScore sama dengan metrik asli (dan kadang-kadang lebih baik), sementara memiliki beberapa perintah ukuran kurang parameter dan berjalan beberapa kali lebih cepat. Pada rata-rata atas semua metrik, tugas, dan varian belajar, FrugalScore menyimpan 96,8% dari prestasi, berjalan 24 kali lebih cepat, dan memiliki 35 kali kurang parameter dari metrik asli. Kami membuat metrik terlatih kami tersedia publik, untuk berguna seluruh komunitas NLP dan khususnya para peneliti dan praktek dengan sumber daya terbatas.', 'fa': 'متریک ارزیابی سریع و قابل اعتماد کلیدی برای پیشرفت R&D است. در حالی که متریک نسل طبیعی سریع هستند، آنها خیلی قابل اعتماد نیستند. در عوض، متریک های جدید بر اساس مدل های زبانی بزرگ پیش ریخته شده بسیار قابل اعتماد ترند، ولی نیاز به منابع محاسباتی مهم است. در این کاغذ، ما فروگالسکور را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک روش برای یاد گرفتن یک نسخه ثابت و کم هزینه\u200cای از هر متریک گران NLG، در حالی که بیشتر عملکرد اصلی آن را نگه می\u200cداریم. تجربه\u200cهایی با BERTScore و MoverScore on summarization and translation نشان می\u200cدهد که FrugalScore is on par with the original metrics (and sometimes better), while having several orders of magnitude less parameters and running several times faster. در میانگین در تمام متریک\u200cها، وظیفه\u200cهای یاد گرفته شده و متغیر\u200cها، فراوگال\u200cاسکور 96.8 درصد عملکرد را نگه می\u200cدارد، ۲۴ بار سریعتر حرکت می\u200cکند و ۳۵ بار کمتر از متریک اصلی دارد. ما متریک آموزش ما را به طور عمومی در دسترس می\u200cدهیم، تا به کل جامعه NLP سود ببریم، و مخصوصاً تحقیقات کنندگان و تمرین کنندگان با منابع محدودیت.', 'ko': '신속하고 신뢰할 수 있는 평가 지표가 연구 개발 진전의 관건이다.전통적인 자연 언어의 생성 도량은 매우 빠르지만 결코 매우 믿을 만한 것은 아니다.반면 대형 예훈련 언어 모델을 바탕으로 한 새로운 지표는 믿을 만하지만 대량의 계산 자원이 필요하다.본고에서 우리는 비싼 NLG 도량의 고정적이고 저비용 버전을 배우는 방법을 제시하면서 대부분의 원시 성능을 보존했다.BERTScore와 MoverScore의 요약과 번역에 대한 실험에 의하면 FrugalScore는 원시 지표와 비슷하고 (때로는 더 좋음) 파라미터가 몇 개의 수량급이 적으며 운행 속도가 몇 배 빠르다는 것을 알 수 있다.FrugalScore는 모든 학습의 지표, 작업 및 변형에서 평균 96.8%의 성능을 유지하며 원래 지표보다 24배 빠르고 매개변수는 35배 적습니다.NLP 커뮤니티 전체, 특히 리소스가 제한된 연구자와 종사자를 행복하게 하기 위해 교육을 받은 지표를 공개합니다.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa uchunguzi wa haraka na unaoaminika ni ufunguo wa maendeleo ya R&D. Wakati vizazi vya asili vya lugha vinaendelea haraka, hawana imani sana. Kwa ujumla, mbinu mpya zinazohusiana na mifano makubwa ya lugha iliyoendelea ni yenye uaminifu zaidi, lakini inahitaji rasilimali muhimu za hisabati. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza FrugalScore, njia ya kujifunza kwa kiwango cha chini cha gharama cha mbinu yoyote yenye gharama za NLG, wakati tunabaki utendaji wake wa awali. Majaribio yenye BERTScore na MoverScore kwenye muhtasari na tafsiri yanaonyesha kwamba FrugalScore yuko kwenye viwanja vya awali (na wakati mwingine vizuri), wakati wakiwa na amri kadhaa ya kiwango kidogo cha parameters na kuendelea mara kadhaa haraka. Kwa wastani zaidi ya mbinu zote zilizojifunza, kazi na mabadiliko, FrugalScore inashikilia asilimia 96.8 ya utendaji huo, inaendesha mara 24 kwa haraka, na ina vipimo 35 zaidi ya mitindo ya awali. Tunafanya mbinu zetu zilizofunzwa zinapatikana hadharani, kuwafaidia jamii yote ya NLP na hususani watafiti na wataalamu wenye rasilimali isiyo na mipaka.', 'af': "Vinnige en betroubare evalueringsmetries is sleutel na R&D vordering. Terwyl tradisionele natuurlike taal generasie metries vinnig is, is hulle nie baie vertroubaar nie. Geomgelyks, nuwe metries gebaseer op groot vorrende taal modele is baie betroubare, maar benodig betekende rekenaar hulpbronne. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons FrugalScore, 'n toegang om 'n vaste, lae koste weergawe van enige koste NLG metrie te leer, terwyl die meeste van sy oorspronklike uitvoering behou. Experiments with BERTScore and MoverScore on summarization and translation show that FrugalScore is on par with the original metrics (and sometimes better), while having several orders of magnitude less parameters and running several times faster. Op gemiddelde oor alle geleerde metrike, opdragte en variante, het FrugalScore 96.8% van die prestasie, loop 24 maal vinniger, en het 35 maal minder parameters as die oorspronklike metrike. Ons maak ons opgeleerde metrike openbaar beskikbaar om die hele NLP gemeenskap te voordeel en in besonderhede ondersoekers en praktikere met beperkte hulpbron.", 'tr': "Hızlı we güýçli deňlenme metrikleri R&D ösüşiniň açary. Adatça tebigy dil döwletleri çalt däldiginde, ol gaty ynamly däldir. Üstelikde, täze metrikler uly öňki dil nusgalaryna daýanýan nusgalar köp ynamlydyr, ýöne wajyp bilgisayar çeşmeleri gerek. Bu kagyzda, FraugalScore'y özüniň başlangyçynyň köpüsini taýýarlyk we düşük bahalaryny öwrenmek üçin bir nusga teklip edýäris. BERTScore we MoverScore bilen juwlamak we terjime eden denminalar FrugalScore özüniň metriýasy bilen paýlaşýar (we käwagt gowurak) we birnäçe görkezilişi beýleki görkezilişi däldir we birnäçe gezek çalt däldir. Ortamda öğrendikleri metrikler, görevler ve variantler üzerinde FrugalScore performansının 96.8% hızlı sürüyor ve orijinal metriklerden 35 kat az parametreleri vardır. Biz öwrenmeli metrikalarymyzy publika meýilleşdirýäris, NLP jemgyýetiniň we özellikle ylgamçylarymyzyň we çykyş çeşmeleri bilen alyp ýetirmek üçin.", 'am': 'ፈጥኖ እና የታመነ ማረጋገጫ ማተሚያዎች ለR&D ፕሮግራም መክፈቻዎች ናቸው። የባሕላዊ የቋንቋ ትውልድ ፍጥረት እጥፍ ሲሆን፣ እጅግ የታመነ አይደሉም፡፡ በተለይ፣ ታላላቅ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በመሠረት አዲስ መተላለፊያ እጅግ የሚታመኑ ናቸው፣ ነገር ግን ትክክል የተቆጠሩ ሀብት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ፍርጉልScore፣ የዋጋው የNLG ሚትሪክ ማንኛውም ዋጋ ዋጋውን ለመማር መግለጫ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የBERTScore እና ሞዋርስኮር በማጠቃለያ እና ትርጓሜዎች ፍሮጉል Score በመጀመሪያው ማተሚያዎች (እና አንዳንድ ጊዜ ይሻላል) በተመሳሳይ ብዙዎች በፓርቲካዎች ላይ እና በጥቂት ጊዜ ፈጥኖ የሚሮጥ ነው፡፡ On average over all learned metrics, tasks, and variants, FrugalScore retains 96.8% of the performance, runs 24 times faster, and has 35 times less parameters than the original metrics.  ተማሪዎችንን የNLP ማኅበረሰብ ሁሉ እና በተለየ አስተማሪዎች እና ባለጠያፊዎች ሀብት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Metrikat e shpejtë dhe të besueshme të vlerësimit janë kyçe për përparimin e R&D. Ndërsa metrikat tradicionale të gjenerimit të gjuhës natyrore janë të shpejtë, ato nuk janë shumë të besueshme. Përkundrazi, metrikat e reja bazuar në modele të mëdha gjuhësh të parastërvitura janë shumë më të besueshme, por kërkojnë burime të rëndësishme llogaritare. Në këtë letër, propozojmë FrugalScore, një qasje për të mësuar një version fiks, me kosto të ulët të çdo metrike të shtrenjtë NLG, duke mbajtur pjesën më të madhe të shfaqjes së saj origjinale. Eksperimentet me BERTScore dhe MoverScore mbi përmbledhjen dhe përkthimin tregojnë se FrugalScore është në krahasim me metrikat origjinale (dhe ndonjëherë më mirë), ndërsa ka disa rende të madhësisë më pak parametra dhe funksionon disa herë më shpejt. Mesatarisht mbi të gjitha metrikat e mësuara, detyrat dhe variantet, FrugalScore mban 96.8% të performancës, funksionon 24 herë më shpejt dhe ka 35 herë më pak parametra se metrikat origjinale. Ne i bëjmë metrikat tona të trajnuara në dispozicion publikisht, për të përfituar të gjithë komunitetin NLP dhe në veçanti kërkuesit dhe praktikantët me burime të kufizuara.', 'bn': 'দ্রুত এবং বিশ্বস্ত মূল্যের মেট্রিক R&D প্রস্থানের কী। যদিও প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রজন্ম দ্রুত প্রজন্ম, তারা খুব বিশ্বস্ত নয়। বিশাল ভাষার মডেল ভিত্তিক নতুন মেট্রিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক কিন্তু গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সম্পদের প্রয়োজন। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ফ্রুগালস্কোর প্রস্তাব করছি, যা কোন দামী এনএলজি মেট্রিকের কোন দামের মূল্যবান সংস্করণ শিখার জন্য একটি সুনির্ধারিত, কম খ বের্টিস্কোর এবং মভার সংক্ষেপ এবং অনুবাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে ফ্রুগালস্কোর মূল মেট্রিক দিয়ে পার (এবং মাঝে মাঝে অনেক ভালো কিছু কিছু নির্দেশ রয়েছে এব সাধারণত সব শিক্ষিত মেট্রিক, কাজ এবং ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিতে ফ্রুগালস্কোরের ৯৬. আমরা পুরো এনএলপি সম্প্রদায় এবং বিশেষ করে গবেষক এবং প্রশিক্ষণীয় কর্মকর্তাদের সীমাবদ্ধ সম্পদের সুবিধা দিতে পারি।', 'hy': 'Հետազոտության և զարգացման առաջընթացի կարևոր է արագ և վստահելի գնահատման չափումները: Մինչդեռ ավանդական բնական լեզուների ստեղծման չափումները արագ են, դրանք շատ վստահելի չեն: Բայց հակառակը, նոր մետրիկները, հիմնված մեծ նախկինում ուսուցված լեզվի մոդելների վրա, շատ ավելի վստահելի են, բայց պահանջում են նշանակալի հաշվարկների ռեսուրսներ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք "Ֆրուգալ Սքուր"-ը, որպեսզի սովորենք ցանկացած թանկ ՆԼԳ մետրիկայի ֆիքսավոր, ցածր արժեքի տարբերակը, մինչդեռ պահպանենք իր սկզբնական արտադրողականությունը Experiments with BERTScore and MoverScore on summarization and translation show that FrugalScore is on par with the original metrics (and sometimes better), while having several orders of magnitude less parameters and running several times faster.  Միջինում բոլոր սովորված մետրիկների, խնդիրների և տարբերակների ընթացքում, ՖրուգալՍքորը պահպանում է արտադրողության 96.8 տոկոսը, աշխատում է 24 անգամ ավելի արագ և ունի 35 անգամ ավելի քիչ պարամետրեր, քան սկզբնական մետրիկները: Մենք հանրային հասանելի ենք դարձնում մեր սովորեցված մետրիկները, որպեսզի օգնենք ՆԼՊ-ի ամբողջ համայնքին, հատկապես հետազոտողներին և մասնագետներին, որոնք սահմանափակ ռեսուրսներ ունեն:', 'ca': "Métriques d'evaluació ràpida i fiable són clau per al progrés de l'I&D. Mentre les mètriques tradicionals de generació de llenguatges naturals són ràpids, no són molt fiables. Per altra banda, les noves mètriques basades en grans models de llenguatge preconformats són molt més fiables, però requeren recursos computacionals significatius. En aquest article, proposem FrugalScore, un enfocament per aprendre una versió fixa i de baix cost de qualsevol metètric de NLG cara, mantenint la majoria del seu rendiment original. Els experiments amb BERTScore i MoverScore en resum i traducció mostren que FrugalScore està al mateix nivell que les mètriques originals (i a vegades millors), mentre que té diverses ordres de magnitud menys par àmetres i funciona moltes vegades més ràpid. En mitjana, en tots els paràmetres, tasques i variants aprenguts, FrugalScore manté el 96,8% del rendiment, funciona 24 vegades més ràpid i té 35 vegades menys paràmetres que els originals. Fem públicament disponibles les nostres mètriques formades, per beneficiar tota la comunitat del NLP, en particular investigadors i practicants amb recursos limitats.", 'az': "Hızlı və güvenilir değerlendirmə metrikləri R&D tədbirlərinin açarıdır. Həmçinin təbiətli dil nəsli metrik hızlı idi, onlar çox güvenilir deyillər. Dərgahca, böyük dil modellərinə dayanan yeni metriklər daha güvenilir, amma mövcud hesablama qüdrəti lazımdır. Bu kağızda, FraugalScore'u təklif edirik, hər bir mal NLG metriklərinin sabit, düşük qiymətli versiyasını öyrənmək üçün təklif edirik, bunun əsl performansının çoxunu saxlayaraq. BERTScore və MoverScore ilə istifadə edilən və çevirilən təcrübələr FrugalScore orijinal metrikləri ilə (və bəzən daha yaxşı), bir neçə böyüklük parametrləri daha az və bir neçə dəfə daha hızlı hərəkət edir. Bütün öyrənmiş metriklərin, işlərin və variabların ortalamasında, FrugalScore performansının 96.8%-ini saxlayar, 24 kat daha hızlı çalışır və orijinal metriklərindən 35 kat daha az parametrləri var. Biz təhsil edilmiş metriklərimizi açıq-aşkar mövcuddur, NLP toplumuna və özlərinə də müəyyən edilmiş sərvətlərlə mükafatlandırmaq üçün təhsil etdik.", 'bs': 'Brza i pouzdana procjena metrika su ključna za napredak istraživanja i razvoj. Dok su tradicionalna prirodna generacija jezika metrika brza, nisu baš pouzdane. U suprotnom, nove metrike bazirane na velikim jezičkim modelima su mnogo pouzdaniji, ali zahtijevaju značajne računalne resurse. U ovom papiru predlažemo FrugalScore, pristup naučiti fiksnu, nisku koštanu verziju svake skupe NLG metrike, dok držimo većinu njegovih originalnih izvora. Eksperimenti sa BERTScore i MoverScore o sažetivanju i prevodu pokazuju da je FrugalScore na par sa originalnim metrikama (i ponekad boljem), dok ima nekoliko naređenja manjih parametara veličine i trčanja nekoliko puta brže. U prosjeku preko svih naučenih metrika, zadataka i varianta, FrugalScore zadržava 96,8% učinka, trči 24 puta brže i ima 35 puta manje parametre od originalne metrike. Obučavamo našu obučenu metriku javno dostupnu, kako bi koristili cijelu zajednicu NLP, a posebno istraživače i praktičnike sa ograničenim resursima.', 'cs': 'Rychlé a spolehlivé hodnotící metriky jsou klíčem k pokroku ve výzkumu a vývoji. Zatímco tradiční metriky generace přirozeného jazyka jsou rychlé, nejsou příliš spolehlivé. Naopak, nové metriky založené na velkých předtrénovaných jazykových modelech jsou mnohem spolehlivější, ale vyžadují značné výpočetní zdroje. V tomto článku navrhujeme FrugalScore, přístup k naučení pevné, nízkonákladové verze jakékoli drahé NLG metriky, při zachování většiny jejího původního výkonu. Experimenty s BERTScore a MoverScore na shrnutí a překlad ukazují, že FrugalScore je na stejné úrovni s původními metrikami (a někdy lepší), přičemž má o několik řádů méně parametrů a běží několikrát rychleji. Ve všech naučených metrikách, úkolech a variantách si FrugalScore v průměru udržuje 96,8% výkonu, běží 24krát rychleji a má 35krát méně parametrů než původní metriky. Naše vyškolené metriky zpřístupníme veřejně, abychom prospěli celé komunitě NLP a zejména výzkumným pracovníkům a odborníkům s omezenými zdroji.', 'et': "Kiired ja usaldusväärsed hindamismeetodid on teadus- ja arendustegevuse edusammude võtmeks. Kuigi traditsioonilised looduskeele genereerimise mõõdikud on kiired, ei ole need eriti usaldusväärsed. Vastupidiselt on uued mõõdikud, mis põhinevad suurtel eelõpetatud keelemudelitel, palju usaldusväärsemad, kuid nõuavad märkimisväärseid arvutusressursse. Käesolevas artiklis pakume välja FrugalScore, lähenemisviis, et õppida fikseeritud, odav versioon mis tahes kallis NLG meetrik, säilitades samas enamiku oma esialgsest jõudlusest. BERTScore'i ja MoverScore'i kokkuvõtlikkuse ja tõlkimise eksperimendid näitavad, et FrugalScore on algsete näitajatega võrdne (ja mõnikord parem), samas kui sellel on mitu suurusjärgu vähem parameetreid ja töötab mitu korda kiiremini. Kõigi õppitud mõõdikute, ülesannete ja variantide puhul säilitab FrugalScore keskmiselt 96,8% jõudlusest, töötab 24 korda kiiremini ja on 35 korda vähem parameetreid kui algsed mõõdikud. Teeme oma koolitatud mõõdikud avalikult kättesaadavaks, et saada kasu kogu NLP kogukonnale ning eelkõige piiratud ressurssidega teadlastele ja praktikutele.", 'fi': 'Nopeat ja luotettavat arviointimittarit ovat avainasemassa T&K-kehityksessä. Vaikka perinteiset luonnollisen kielen generoinnin mittarit ovat nopeita, ne eivät ole kovin luotettavia. Toisaalta uudet mittasuhteet, jotka perustuvat suuriin esikoulutettuihin kielimalleihin, ovat paljon luotettavampia, mutta vaativat merkittäviä laskentaresursseja. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme FrugalScore-menetelmää, jolla opitaan kiinteä, edullinen versio mistä tahansa kalliista NLG-mittareista säilyttäen suurimman osan alkuperäisestä suorituskyvystään. BERTScore- ja MoverScore-kokeilut tiivistelmästä ja kääntämisestä osoittavat, että FrugalScore on samanlainen alkuperäisten mittareiden kanssa (ja joskus parempi), vaikka sillä on useita suuruusluokkia vähemmän parametreja ja se toimii useita kertoja nopeammin. FrugalScore säilyttää keskimäärin 96,8% suorituskyvystä, toimii 24 kertaa nopeammin ja 35 kertaa vähemmän parametreja kuin alkuperäiset mittarit. Annamme koulutetut mittarit julkisesti saataville koko NLP-yhteisön ja erityisesti rajallisten resurssien omaavien tutkijoiden ja ammattilaisten hyödyksi.', 'jv': 'iku Nanging, kita bener kelas kuwi kapan banget tulisan, kuwi ora apik tenan ngono. Ingka oleh, metar sing paling nggambar sistem anyar tentang karo model sing luwih basa luwih apik, kaya supoyo akeh sistem komputer Nang peuter iki, kita mudhun nglebok Fragal Name Jura-Juara Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem dipunangé para awak dhéwé, kanggo ngilangno komunitas NLP kuwi nggawe barang-barêng kanggo kebebasané karo perusahaan kanggo ngilangno dolanan sing isiné.', 'ha': "Metricki na ƙidãya mai Faso da mai aminci sune maɓallin tsofon R.D. A lokacin da kizayen harshe na asiyya na kabari, ba su zama mai amintarwa ba. Wakati da yake, metric sãbuwa a kan misãlai masu ƙaranci cikin harshen na'ura, sun ƙayyade masu inganci, kuma amma yana da amfani da masu ƙari na lissafi. Ga wannan takardan, Muke bukãtar da Freugalscore, wata hanyoyi ta sanar da wata tabbatacce, mai ƙaranci ko wani nau'in metrici na NLG masu kyauta, kuma suna tsari mafi yawancin aikin na farko. KCharselect unicode block name Ga tsakanin duk metric, aikin da aka sanar da shi, Fugalscore yana ƙunsa da 96.8% na aikin, yana tafiyar da 24 sau kasi sau 24, kuma yana da parameteri 35 sau mafi ƙaranci daga metric na farko. Tuna sami mafarinta da aka sanar da su a cikin bayani, dõmin in amfani da jamii duk NLP, da hususanci masu sakaita da mazabincin da mataimaki mabakin.", 'he': 'מטריות עריכה מהירות ואמינות הן מפתחות להתקדמות במחקר-פיתוח. בעוד מטריות דורת שפת טבעית מסורתיות מהירות, הן לא מאוד אמינות. בניגוד לזה, מטריות חדשות מבוססות על דוגמני שפת גדולים מתאמנים מראש הן הרבה יותר אמינות, אך דורשות משאבים מחשביים משמעותיים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים FrugalScore, גישה ללמוד גרסה קבועה, בעלות נמוכה של כל מטריקה יקרה NLG, בזמן שמירה את רוב ההופעה המקורית שלה. ניסויים עם BERTScore ו MoverScore על סכם ותרגום מראים שFrugalScore שווה עם המטריקה המקורית (ולפעמים טובה יותר), בזמן שיש מספר פקודות של גודל פחות פרמטרים ורוצה מספר פעמים מהר יותר. בממוצע על כל המטריקות, המשימות והשונות למדו, FrugalScore שומר 96.8% מהביצועים, פועל 24 פעמים מהר יותר, ויש לו 35 פעמים פחות פרמטיקות מהמטריקה המקורית. אנחנו פועלים את המטריקה המאמנת שלנו פנויה לציבור, כדי להרוויח לכל קהילת NLP ובמיוחד חוקרים ומאמנים עם משאבים מוגבלים.', 'sk': 'Hitre in zanesljive meritve ocenjevanja so ključnega pomena za napredek v raziskavah in razvoju. Medtem ko so tradicionalne meritve generiranja naravnega jezika hitre, niso preveč zanesljive. Nasprotno pa so nove meritve, ki temeljijo na velikih predtreniranih jezikovnih modelih, veliko bolj zanesljive, vendar zahtevajo znatne računalniške vire. V tem članku predlagamo FrugalScore, pristop za učenje fiksne, nizkocenovne različice katere koli drage meritve NLG, hkrati pa ohranjamo večino svoje prvotne zmogljivosti. Eksperimenti z BERTScore in MoverScore o povzetku in prevajanju kažejo, da je FrugalScore enak prvotnim merilom (in včasih boljši), medtem ko ima več razredov velikosti manj parametrov in teče večkrat hitreje. V povprečju pri vseh učenih meritvah, opravilih in različicah FrugalScore ohrani 96,8% zmogljivosti, teče 24-krat hitreje in ima 35-krat manj parametrov kot prvotne meritve. Naše usposobljene meritve dajemo javnosti na voljo, da bi koristile celotni skupnosti NLP in zlasti raziskovalcem in strokovnjakom z omejenimi viri.', 'bo': 'མགྱོག་དང་ཡིད་རྟོན་རུང་བའི་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་འདི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་གལ་ཆེ། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་མི་རབས་མགྱོག་རིང་དུ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་དག་ནི་ཁྱད་ད Conversely, new metrics based on large pretrained language models are much more reliable, but require significant computational resources. In this paper, we propose FrugalScore, an approach to learn a fixed, low cost version of any expensive NLG metric, while retaining most of its original performance. Experiments with BERTScore and MoverScore on summarization and translation show that FrugalScore is on par with the original metrics (and sometimes better), while having several orders of magnitude less parameters and running several times faster. On average over all learned metrics, tasks, and variants, FrugalScore retains 96.8% of the performance, runs 24 times faster, and has 35 times less parameters than the original metrics. We make our trained metrics publicly available, to benefit the entire NLP community and in particular researchers and practitioners with limited resources.'}
{'en': 'Probing Simile Knowledge from Pre-trained Language Models', 'pt': 'Um texto bem composto está pela metade! Amostragem de Composição para Geração Condicional Diversas', 'ar': 'تم الانتهاء من نصف النص الذي تم تكوينه جيدًا! أخذ عينات التكوين للجيل الشرطي المتنوع', 'es': '¡Un texto bien compuesto está hecho a medias! Muestreo de composición para generación condicional diversa', 'fr': "Un texte bien composé, c'est à moitié fini\xa0! Échantillonnage de composition pour diverses générations conditionnelles", 'ru': 'Хорошо составленный текст наполовину выполнен! Состав выборки для диверсифицированной условной генерации', 'zh': '一精一半! 多样化以成采样', 'ja': 'よくまとめられたテキストが半分になりました！多様な条件付生成のための組成サンプリング', 'hi': 'एक अच्छी तरह से रचित पाठ आधा किया है! विविध सशर्त पीढ़ी के लिए संरचना नमूना', 'ga': 'Tá Téacs Dea-Chomhdhéanta Leathdhéanta! Sampláil Comhdhéanaimh do Ghiniúint Éagsúil Coinníollach', 'hu': 'A jól összeállított szöveg félig kész! Összetételi mintavétel különböző feltételes generációhoz', 'el': 'Ένα καλογραμμένο κείμενο είναι μισοτελειωμένο! Δειγματοληψία σύνθεσης για ποικίλη υπό όρους παραγωγή', 'ka': 'კომპონცირებული ტექსტი დასრულია! განსხვავებული სოდენციონალური განვითარებისთვის გამოყენება', 'it': 'Un testo ben composto è a metà fatto! Campionamento della composizione per diverse generazioni condizionali', 'lt': 'Gerai suformuluotas tekstas yra pusė atliktas! Įvairių sąlygų generacijos sudėties mėginių ėmimas', 'kk': 'Жақсы құрылған мәтін жарты аяқталды! Түрлі шарттарды құру үшін композициялық үлгілеу', 'mk': 'Добро композиран текст е половина завршен! Избирање на примероци за различни условни генерации', 'ml': 'ഒരു നല്ല പദാവലി പാതി കഴിഞ്ഞു! വ്യത്യസ്തമായ തലമുറന്നതിനായി കോമ്പോഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'ms': 'Teks Berkomposisi Baik Setengah Selesai! Sampel Komposisi untuk Jenerasi Berbeda Suara', 'mt': 'Test kompost tajjeb isir bin-nofs! Kampjunar tal-Kompożizzjoni għal Ġenerazzjoni Kondizzjonali Diversa', 'mn': 'Сайн бичсэн текст хагас дууслаа! Дөрвөн нөхцөл төрөлхтний төлөвлөгөөний жишээн зураг', 'no': 'Ein velkomprimert tekst er halvparten ferdig! Sampling av samlinga for ulike vilkårleg generering', 'pl': 'Dobrze skomponowany tekst jest w połowie gotowy! Pobieranie próbek składu dla różnych warunkowych generacji', 'ro': 'Un text bine compus este pe jumătate gata! Eșantionare de compoziție pentru generarea condițională diversă', 'sr': 'Dobro kompozirani tekst je pola završen! Uzorak uzorka za različite uvjetne generacije', 'so': 'A Well-Composed Text is half done! Heshiiska sameynta qaabilsan', 'sv': 'En välkomponerad text är halvt klar! Sammansättning Provtagning för olika villkorliga genereringar', 'si': 'හොඳයි- සම්පූර්ණ පාළුවක් හතරක් ඉවරයි! විවිධ සාමාන්තික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සංවිධානය සැම්පල් කරන්න', 'ta': 'ஒரு நன்றாக ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட உரை பாதி முடிந்தது! வெவ்வேறு நிபந்தனை உருவாக்கத்திற்கான கூற்று ஒப்பிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'ایک اچھا پیغام آدھا ہوا ہے! مختلف شرط پیدائش کے لئے کامپیوتن نمونڈ', 'uz': 'Tekshirilgan matn nusxasi tugadi! Comment', 'vi': 'Một văn bản được hòa xong một nửa rồi! Mẫu sự kết hợp cho chế độ lặn', 'bg': 'Добре съставен текст е полуготов! Вземане на проби от състав за разнообразно условно генериране', 'nl': 'Een goed samengestelde tekst is half klaar! Samenstelling Sampling voor diverse voorwaardelijke generatie', 'hr': 'Dobro kompozirani tekst je pola završen! Uzorak kompozicije za različite uvjetne generacije', 'da': 'En velkomponeret tekst er halvt færdig! Sammensætningsprøveudtagning til forskellig betinget produktion', 'de': 'Ein gut verfasster Text ist halb fertig! Komposition Sampling für vielfältige konditionelle Erzeugung', 'id': 'Teks Berkomposisi Sedikit Selesai! Sampel Komposisi untuk Generasi Berbeda Kondisional', 'fa': 'یک متن خوب پیوند شده نصف تموم شده است! نمونه\u200cهای ترکیب برای نسل شرایط مختلف', 'ko': '좋은 문장은 성공의 절반이다!다원적 조건으로 생성된 합성 표본 추출', 'sw': 'Maandishi yaliyotengenezwa ni nusu imemalizika! Mfano wa Mfano wa Uzalishaji wa Hali tofauti', 'tr': 'Bir Metin Yarı Bitdi! Çeşitli Durum Jeşirmek üçin Samlançy', 'af': "'n Wel- geskep Teks is halwe voltooi! Sampling vir Verskeie Bedinge Generasie", 'sq': 'Një tekst i kompozuar mirë është gjysmë i përfunduar! Zgjidhje për gjenerimin e ndryshëm të kushteve', 'hy': 'Լավ կազմված տեքստը կես ավարտվել է: Comment', 'am': 'የተፈጸመ ጽሑፍ ተፈጸመ! ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Yaxşı Mətn Yarısı Bitdi! Müxtəlif şartlar Məxluqatı üçün məlumatlar', 'bn': 'একটি ভাল-কম্পোসেড টেক্সট অর্ধেক শেষ! Name', 'ca': 'A Well-Composed Text is Half Done!  Mostrar la composició per a generació condicional diversa', 'bs': 'Dobro kompozirani tekst je pola završen! Uzorak kompozicije za različite uvjetne generacije', 'cs': 'Dobře složený text je napůl hotový! Vzorkování složek pro různé podmíněné generace', 'et': 'Hästi koostatud tekst on pooleldi valmis! Koostisproovide võtmine mitmekesise tingimusliku tootmise jaoks', 'fi': 'Hyvin muotoiltu teksti on puoliksi valmis! Kokoonpanonäytteenotto monimuotoista ehdollista tuotantoa varten', 'jv': 'structural navigation Sample Sampling kanggo Generasi Gak Dikenayran', 'he': 'טקסט מורכב היטב הוא חצי עשוי! דוגמא מורכבת לייצור תנאי שונה', 'sk': 'Dobro sestavljeno besedilo je na pol končano! Vzorčenje sestave za različno pogojno proizvodnjo', 'bo': 'མཉམ་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་ཕྱེད་ཀྱིས་ཚར་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། སྣ་འདྲ་སྒྲིག་གནས་སྟངས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ལ་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས', 'ha': '@ item Text character set @ action'}
{'en': 'Simile interpretation (SI) and simile generation (SG) are challenging tasks for NLP because models require adequate world knowledge to produce predictions. Previous works have employed many hand-crafted resources to bring knowledge-related into models, which is time-consuming and labor-intensive. In recent years, pre-trained language models (PLMs) based approaches have become the de-facto standard in NLP since they learn generic knowledge from a large corpus. The knowledge embedded in PLMs may be useful for SI and SG tasks. Nevertheless, there are few works to explore it. In this paper, we probe simile knowledge from PLMs to solve the SI and SG tasks in the unified framework of simile triple completion for the first time. The backbone of our framework is to construct masked sentences with manual patterns and then predict the candidate words in the masked position. In this framework, we adopt a secondary training process (Adjective-Noun mask Training) with the masked language model (MLM) loss to enhance the prediction diversity of candidate words in the masked position. Moreover, pattern ensemble (PE) and pattern search (PS) are applied to improve the quality of predicted words. Finally, automatic and human evaluations demonstrate the effectiveness of our framework in both SI and SG tasks.', 'ar': 'نقترح أخذ عينات التركيب ، وهي طريقة بسيطة ولكنها فعالة لتوليد مخرجات متنوعة للجيل المشروط بجودة أعلى مقارنة باستراتيجيات فك التشفير العشوائية السابقة. إنه يعتمد على نماذج الجيل العصبي المستندة إلى الخطة المقترحة مؤخرًا (FROST ، Narayan et al ، 2021) التي تم تدريبها على إنشاء تركيبة للمخرجات أولاً ثم التوليد عن طريق التكييف عليها والمدخلات. يتجنب نهجنا انحطاط النص عن طريق أخذ عينات أولاً من تركيبة في شكل سلسلة كيان ثم استخدام بحث الحزمة لتوليد أفضل نص ممكن قائم على سلسلة الكيان هذه. تجارب على التلخيص (CNN / DailyMail و XSum) وتوليد الأسئلة (SQuAD) ، باستخدام تلقائي موجود ومقترح حديثًا\nتُظهر المقاييس جنبًا إلى جنب مع التقييم القائم على الإنسان أن أخذ عينات التركيب هو حاليًا أفضل استراتيجية متاحة لفك التشفير لتوليد مخرجات متنوعة ذات مغزى.', 'pt': 'Propomos o Composition Sampling, um método simples, mas eficaz para gerar diversos outputs para geração condicional de maior qualidade em comparação com as estratégias de decodificação estocástica anteriores. Ele se baseia em modelos de geração neural baseados em planos recentemente propostos (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) que são treinados para primeiro criar uma composição da saída e depois gerar condicionando-a e a entrada. Nossa abordagem evita a degeneração do texto, primeiro amostrando uma composição na forma de uma cadeia de entidades e, em seguida, usando a pesquisa de feixe para gerar o melhor texto possível com base nessa cadeia de entidades. Experimentos de sumarização (CNN/DailyMail e XSum) e geração de perguntas (SQuAD), usando\nmétricas juntamente com avaliação baseada em humanos, demonstram que a Amostragem de Composição é atualmente a melhor estratégia de decodificação disponível para gerar diversos resultados significativos.', 'es': 'Proponemos Composition Sampling, un método simple pero efectivo para generar diversas salidas para la generación condicional de mayor calidad en comparación con las estrategias de decodificación estocástica anteriores. Se basa en modelos de generación neuronal basados en planes recientemente propuestos (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) que se entrenan para crear primero una composición de la salida y luego generar condicionándola y la entrada. Nuestro enfoque evita la degeneración del texto al muestrear primero una composición en forma de cadena de entidades y luego usar la búsqueda por haces para generar el mejor texto posible basado en esta cadena de entidades. Experimentos de sumarización (CNN/DailyMail y XSum) y generación de preguntas (sQuad), utilizando sistemas automáticos existentes y recientemente propuestos\njunto con la evaluación basada en humanos, demuestran que Composition Sampling es actualmente la mejor estrategia de decodificación disponible para generar diversos resultados significativos.', 'fr': "Nous proposons l'échantillonnage de composition, une méthode simple mais efficace pour générer diverses sorties pour une génération conditionnelle de meilleure qualité par rapport aux stratégies de décodage stochastique précédentes. Il s'appuie sur des modèles de génération neuronale basés sur des plans récemment proposés (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) qui sont formés pour créer d'abord une composition de la sortie, puis générer en conditionnant celle-ci et l'entrée. Notre approche évite la dégénérescence du texte en échantillonnant d'abord une composition sous la forme d'une chaîne d'entités, puis en utilisant la recherche par faisceau pour générer le meilleur texte possible basé sur cette chaîne d'entités. Expériences sur la synthèse (CNN/Dailymail et xSum) et la génération de questions (SQuAD), à l'aide de la fonction automatique existante et nouvellement proposée\nles métriques associées à l'évaluation humaine démontrent que l'échantillonnage de composition est actuellement la meilleure stratégie de décodage disponible pour générer divers résultats significatifs.", 'ja': '構文サンプリングは、以前の確率的デコード戦略と比較して、より高い品質を条件付きで生成するための多様な出力を生成するためのシンプルで効果的な方法です。 最近提案された計画ベースのニューラルジェネレーションモデル（ Frost, Narayan et al, 2021 ）に基づいて構築され、最初に出力の構成を作成し、次にそれと入力を調整することによって生成するように訓練されています。  当社のアプローチは、まずエンティティチェーンの形式で組成物をサンプリングし、次にビーム検索を使用して、このエンティティチェーンに接地された可能な限り最良のテキストを生成することによって、テキストの変性を回避します。 既存のおよび新たに提案された自動診断を使用した、要約（ CNN/DailyMailおよびXSum ）および質問生成（ SQuAD ）の実験\nこれらのメトリックは、人間に基づいた評価とともに、コンポジションサンプリングが、多様な意味のある出力を生成するために現在利用可能な最良のデコード戦略であることを示しています。', 'zh': '吾合采样,此简而效,可以生异,以比前机解码策,有以成高质量者也。 立于近者神经成于(FROST,Narayan等于2021),先为之组,而后条件反射输之。  吾法先采样以实体,然后以波束索为本,以避文本退化。 总(CNN/DailyMailXSum)成(SQuAD)之实验,用见自新\n指标与人工评估,采样目前生成诸义输最佳解码策也。', 'hi': 'हम संरचना नमूनाकरण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, पिछले स्टोकेस्टिक डिकोडिंग रणनीतियों की तुलना में उच्च गुणवत्ता की सशर्त पीढ़ी के लिए विविध आउटपुट उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक सरल लेकिन प्रभावी तरीका। यह हाल ही में प्रस्तावित योजना-आधारित तंत्रिका पीढ़ी मॉडल (FROST, नारायण एट अल, 2021) पर बनाता है जिसे पहले आउटपुट की संरचना बनाने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है और फिर इसे और इनपुट पर कंडीशनिंग करके उत्पन्न किया जाता है।  हमारा दृष्टिकोण पहले एक इकाई श्रृंखला के रूप में एक संरचना का नमूना लेकर पाठ अध: पतन से बचता है और फिर इस इकाई श्रृंखला के लिए सबसे अच्छा संभव पाठ उत्पन्न करने के लिए बीम खोज का उपयोग करता है। सारांशीकरण (सीएनएन / डेलीमेल और एक्ससम) और प्रश्न पीढ़ी (SQuAD) पर प्रयोग, मौजूदा और नए प्रस्तावित स्वचालित का उपयोग करके\nमानव-आधारित मूल्यांकन के साथ मैट्रिक्स, यह प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि संरचना नमूनाकरण वर्तमान में विविध सार्थक आउटपुट उत्पन्न करने के लिए सबसे अच्छी उपलब्ध डिकोडिंग रणनीति है।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем Composition Sampling, простой, но эффективный метод для генерации разнообразных выходов для условной генерации более высокого качества по сравнению с предыдущими стратегиями стохастического декодирования. Она основана на недавно предложенных моделях генерации нейронов, основанных на плане (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021), которые обучены сначала создавать композицию выхода, а затем генерировать, обусловливая ее и входные данные.  Наш подход позволяет избежать дегенерации текста, сначала отобрав композицию в виде цепочки сущностей, а затем используя поиск лучей для создания наилучшего текста, основанного на этой цепочке сущностей. Эксперименты по обобщению (CNN/DailyMail и XSum) и формированию вопросов (SQuAD) с использованием существующих и новых предлагаемых автоматических\nметрики вместе с человеческой оценкой демонстрируют, что Композиционная выборка в настоящее время является наилучшей доступной стратегией декодирования для генерации разнообразных значимых результатов.', 'ga': 'Molaimid Sampláil Comhdhéanaimh, modh simplí ach éifeachtach chun aschuir ilghnéitheacha a ghiniúint chun cáilíocht níos airde a ghiniúint go coinníollach i gcomparáid le straitéisí díchódaithe stocastic roimhe seo. Tógann sé ar mhúnlaí giniúna néaracha plean-bhunaithe a moladh le déanaí (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) atá oilte chun comhdhéanamh an aschuir a chruthú ar dtús agus ansin giniúint trí riochtú air agus ar an ionchur. Seachnaíonn ár gcur chuige meathlú téacs trí chomhdhéanamh a shampláil ar dtús i bhfoirm slabhra aonáin agus ansin cuardach bíoma a úsáid chun an téacs is fearr is féidir a ghiniúint atá bunaithe ar an slabhra aonáin seo. Turgnaimh ar achoimre (CNN/DailyMail agus XSum) agus giniúint ceisteanna (SQuAD), ag baint úsáide as uathoibríoch reatha agus nua-mholta\nLéiríonn méadracht mar aon le meastóireacht duine-bhunaithe gurb é Sampláil Comhdhéanta an straitéis díchódaithe is fearr atá ar fáil faoi láthair chun aschuir bhrí éagsúla a ghiniúint.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε τη δειγματοληψία σύνθεσης, μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική μέθοδο για την παραγωγή διαφορετικών αποτελεσμάτων για την υπό όρους παραγωγή υψηλότερης ποιότητας σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενες στρατηγικές stochastic decodering. Βασίζεται σε πρόσφατα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα νευρωνικής παραγωγής (FROST, Narayan κ.α., 2021) που εκπαιδεύονται να δημιουργούν πρώτα μια σύνθεση της παραγωγής και στη συνέχεια να παράγουν με τον όρο σε αυτό και την εισαγωγή. Η προσέγγισή μας αποφεύγει τον εκφυλισμό κειμένου με πρώτα δειγματοληψία μιας σύνθεσης με τη μορφή μιας αλυσίδας οντοτήτων και στη συνέχεια χρησιμοποιώντας αναζήτηση ακτίνων για να δημιουργήσετε το καλύτερο δυνατό κείμενο βασισμένο σε αυτήν την αλυσίδα οντοτήτων. Πειράματα σύνοψης (CNN/DailyMail και XSum) και δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων (SQuAD), χρησιμοποιώντας υπάρχοντα και πρόσφατα προτεινόμενα αυτόματα', 'hu': 'Javasoljuk a kompozíciós mintavételt, egy egyszerű, de hatékony módszert, amely különböző kimeneteket generál a korábbi sztochasztikus dekódolási stratégiákhoz képest jobb minőségű feltételes generáláshoz. A közelmúltban javasolt terv alapú neurális generációs modellekre épül (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021), amelyeket először a kimenet összetételének létrehozására képeznek, majd kondicionálással generálnak. Megközelítésünk elkerüli a szövegdegenerációt, először egy entitáslánc formájában lévő kompozíció mintavételével, majd sugárkereséssel hozzuk létre a lehető legjobb szöveget erre az entitásláncra alapozva. Összefoglalási kísérletek (CNN/DailyMail és XSum) és kérdések generálására (SQUAD), meglévő és újonnan javasolt automatikus felhasználásával', 'ka': 'ჩვენ კომპოზიციონის ჩანაწერის გამოყენება, რომელიც უფრო მაგრამ ეფექტიური გამოყენება განსხვავებული გამოყენებების შექმნა, რომელიც უფრო მარტივი კალექტიის შემდეგ წინ ეს ახლა დაახლოებით პლანზე მიღებული ნეიროლის განვითარების მოდელზე (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021), რომლებიც პირველად განვითარებულია გამოყენების კომპოზიციის შექმნა და შემდეგ განვითარებულია, რომლებიც მისი და მი ჩვენი პროგორმა გადარჩენა ტექსტის განსხვავებას, პირველად განსხვავებული კომპოზიციის ფორმაში და შემდეგ განსხვავებას გამოყენება, რომ შეიქმნა ყველაზე საკმაოდ შესაძლებელი ტექსტი, რომე (CNN/DailyMail და XSum) და კითხვის განვითარება (SQuAD) გამოყენება, სექსენტის და ახალი განვითარებული ავტომატიკური გამოყენება', 'it': "Proponiamo Composition Sampling, un metodo semplice ma efficace per generare output diversi per la generazione condizionale di qualità superiore rispetto alle precedenti strategie di decodifica stocastica. Si basa su modelli di generazione neurale basati su piani recentemente proposti (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) che sono addestrati per creare prima una composizione dell'output e poi generare condizionando su di esso e l'input. Il nostro approccio evita la degenerazione del testo campionando prima una composizione sotto forma di catena di entità e poi utilizzando la ricerca del fascio per generare il miglior testo possibile basato su questa catena di entità. Esperimenti sulla sintesi (CNN/DailyMail e XSum) e sulla generazione di domande (SQUAD), utilizzando automatici esistenti e nuovi proposti", 'lt': 'We propose Composition Sampling, a simple but effective method to generate diverse outputs for conditional generation of higher quality compared to previous stochastic decoding strategies.  Ji grindžiama neseniai pasiūlytais planu grindžiamais nervų generacijos modeliais (FROST, Narayan et al., 2021 m.), kurie yra parengti pirmiausia kurti produkcijos sudėtį, o vėliau ją gaminti su sąlyga ir įnašais. Mūsų metodas išvengia teksto degeneracijos, pirmiausia imant mėginius, susidedant iš ūkio subjekto grandinės pavidalo, o vėliau naudojant šviesos paiešką, kad būtų sukurtas geriausias įmanomas tekstas, grindžiamas šios ūkio subjekto grandine. Apibendrinimo (CNN/DailyMail ir XSum) ir klausimų generavimo (SQuAD) eksperimentai, naudojant esamus ir naujai pasiūlytus automatinius', 'kk': 'Біз композициялық үлгілерін қарапайым, бірақ эффективті әдіс, алдыңғы stochastic decoding стратегиясына салыстыру үшін шарттардың көптеген сапатты жасау үшін әртүрлі нәтижелерді құру Бұл жаңа жұмыс істеген план негіздеген невралды құру үлгілеріне (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) құрылады. Біріншіден шығыс құрылысын құру үшін бірінші жоспардың құрылысын құрып, содан кейін оны және кіріс жаса Біздің тәсіліміз бірінші нысандар тізімінің түрінде мәтін дегенерациясын өзгертуге болады. Содан кейін оны іздеу үшін, бұл нысандар тізіміне қолданылатын ең жақсы мәтін құру үшін Тұжырымдамасын (CNN/DailyMail және XSum) және сұрақ құру (SQuAD) тәжірибелері, бар жаңа және жаңа таңдалған автоматты түрде қолданылады', 'mk': 'Ние предложуваме примерок на композиција, едноставен но ефикасен метод за генерирање различни излези за условна генерација на повисок квалитет во споредба со претходните стокастички декодирачки стратегии. Истата се базира на неодамна предложени плановни модели за нервна генерација (ФРОСТ, Нарајан и други, 2021), кои се обучени за прво да создадат композиција на излезот и потоа да генерираат со услов на него и внесот. Нашиот пристап ја избегнува текстовата дегенерација со прво примерување на композиција во форма на ланец на ентитети и потоа користење пребарување по прозорец за генерирање на најдобриот можно текст основан на овој ланец на ентитети. Експерименти за резултат (CNN/DailyMail и XSum) и генерација на прашања (SQuAD), користејќи постоечки и ново предложени автоматски', 'ml': 'മുമ്പുള്ള സ്റ്റോക്സിക് ഡികോഡിങ്ങിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d തലമുറയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ, പക്ഷെ പ്ര It builds on recently proposed plan-based neural generation models (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) that are trained to first create a composition of the output and then generate by conditioning on it and the input.   നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് മാത്രം ഒരു സാധാരണ ചങ്ങലിന്റെ രൂപത്തില്\u200d ഒരു കണക്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും പിന്നീട് ബീമിന്റെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d  നിലവിലുള്ളതും പുതിയ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച സ്വയമായി ഉപയോഗിച്ചു', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan Sampling Komposisi, kaedah sederhana tetapi berkesan untuk menghasilkan output berbeza untuk generasi syarat kualiti yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan strategi penyahkodan stokastik terdahulu. Ia dibangun pada model generasi saraf berasaskan rancangan baru-baru ini (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) yang dilatih untuk pertama-tama mencipta komposisi output dan kemudian menghasilkan dengan menguasainya dan input. Pendekatan kami mengelakkan degenerasi teks dengan mengambil sampel pertama komposisi dalam bentuk rantai entiti dan kemudian menggunakan carian cahaya untuk menghasilkan teks terbaik yang mungkin didasarkan ke rantai entiti ini. Eksperimen tentang ringkasan (CNN/DailyMail dan XSum) dan generasi soalan (SQuAD), menggunakan automatik yang ada dan yang baru diusulkan', 'mn': 'Бид Composition Sampling, энгийн гэхдээ үр дүнтэй арга зам нь өмнөх stochastic decoding стратегийг харьцуулахын тулд нөхцөл чанарын үр дүнг олох шаардлагатай. Энэ нь саяхан санал өгсөн төлөвлөгөөнд суурилсан мэдрэлийн төлөвлөгөөний загвар (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) дээр зохион байгуулагддаг. Эхлээд үр дүн бүтээгдэхүүний зохион байгуулалт болон дараа нь нөхцөл болон орлуулалт гаргаж Бидний арга баримтууд биетийн хэлхээ хэмжээний хувьд биетийн хэлхээ хуваалцаж, хамгийн сайн боломжтой текст бий болгохын тулд биетийн хамгийн сайн арга баримтуудыг ашигладаг. Тодруулах туршилт (CNN/DailyMail, XSum) болон асуулт үүсгэх (SQuAD), суралцах болон шинэ санал автоматжуулан ашиглаж,', 'ro': 'Vă propunem Composition Sampling, o metodă simplă, dar eficientă de a genera rezultate diverse pentru generarea condiționată de calitate superioară comparativ cu strategiile de decodare stocastică anterioare. Acesta se bazează pe modele de generare neuronală bazate pe plan recent propuse (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021), care sunt instruite pentru a crea mai întâi o compoziție a ieșirii și apoi generarea prin condiționarea acesteia și a intrarii. Abordarea noastră evită degenerarea textului prin eșantionarea unei compoziții sub forma unui lanț de entități și apoi folosirea căutării fasciculului pentru a genera cel mai bun text posibil bazat pe acest lanț de entități. Experimente privind rezumarea (CNN/DailyMail și XSum) și generarea de întrebări (SQUAD), utilizând automate existente și nou propuse', 'pl': 'Proponujemy Composition Sampling, prostą, ale skuteczną metodę generowania różnorodnych wyników dla warunkowego generowania wyższej jakości w porównaniu do poprzednich strategii dekodowania stochastycznego. Opiera się on na niedawno zaproponowanych modelach generacji neuronów opartych na planach (FROST, Narayan i al., 2021), które są przeszkolone do tworzenia kompozycji wyjścia, a następnie generowania poprzez uwarunkowanie na nim i wejściu. Nasze podejście unika degeneracji tekstu poprzez najpierw próbkowanie kompozycji w postaci łańcucha podmiotów, a następnie wykorzystanie wiązki do generowania najlepszego możliwego tekstu opartego na tym łańcuchu podmiotów. Eksperymenty z zakresu podsumowania (CNN/DailyMail i XSum) i generowania pytań (SQuAD), z wykorzystaniem istniejących i nowo proponowanych automatycznych', 'no': 'Vi foreslår samlinga av komponentsprøver, ein enkel, men effektiv metode for å laga ulike utgåver for conditional generasjon av høgare kvalitet sammenlignet med førre stokastiske dekodingsstrategiar. Det bygger på nyleg foreslått planbaserte neuralgenereringsmodeller (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) som er trengte for å først laga eit komponent av utdata og så laga ved kondicionasjon på det og inndata. Tilnærminga vårt unngår å degenerera teksten ved å første samling av eit komponent i form av ein entitetskjede og så bruka strålsøk for å laga den beste moglege teksten basert til denne entitetskjeden. Eksperimentar om samandringa (CNN/DailyMail og XSum) og spørsmål (SQuAD), brukar eksisterande og nytt foreslått automatisk', 'si': 'අපි කොම්පොසිටන් සැම්ප්ලින්ග් සැලසුම් කරනවා, සරල නමුත් පරීක්ෂිත විදියට විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශය ඒක අලුත් සැලසුම් අධාරිත සැලසුම් සැලසුම් අධාරිත නිර්මාණය නිර්මාණය මඩේල්ස් (FROST, Narayn et al, 2021) වෙනුවෙන්, මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්පූර අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පැත්තක් විනාශ කරනවා පලවෙනි පරීක්ෂණයක් සැම්පල් කරනවා අන්තිම පරීක්ෂණයක් වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක් වල සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය (CNN/DaylyMail සහ XSum) සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය (SQuAD), තියෙන හා අළුත් ප', 'so': 'Waxaan soo jeedaynaa sameynta Composition, waa qaab fudud laakiin saamayn ah oo aan soo saarno midho kala duduwan oo ah qarniga dhalashada qiimaha sare oo la barbarbaro qorshaha hore ee qodolka. Waxay ku dhisantaa qaabab qarni neurada ah ee ugu dhowaad qorshaha lagu qoray (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) oo loo baray in marka hore la sameeyo qalabka soo baxa kadibna lagu sameeyo shuruudo ku saabsan iyo input. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu wuxuu ka fogaadaa degdegaanka qoraalka marka ugu horeysa tusaale ahaan qaabka jidhka silsilad, kadibna waxaa lagu isticmaalaa raadinta saxda si uu u sameeyo macluumaadka ugu wanaagsan ee lagu aasaasay silsiladdan. XQuAD, isticmaalaya existing and newly proposed automatic', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår Composition Sampling, en enkel men effektiv metod för att generera olika utgångar för villkorlig generering av högre kvalitet jämfört med tidigare stokastiska avkodningsstrategier. Den bygger på nyligen föreslagna planbaserade neurala generationsmodeller (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) som utbildas för att först skapa en sammansättning av output och sedan generera genom konditionering på det och input. Vårt tillvägagångssätt undviker textdegenerering genom att först samva en komposition i form av en entitetskedja och sedan använda strålsökning för att generera bästa möjliga text baserad på denna entitetskedja. Experiment på sammanfattning (CNN/DailyMail och XSum) och frågegenerering (SQUAD), med hjälp av befintlig och nyligen föreslagen automatisk', 'ta': 'நாம் நிறுவனம் மாதிரி செய்வது, முந்தைய நிறுவப்பட்ட முறையில் சுலபமான ஆனால் வெளியீடுகளை உருவாக்க வேண்டும் சுலபமான ஆனால் வெளியீ இது சமீபத்தில் திட்டத்தில் அடிப்படையிலான புதிய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில் கட்டுகிறது (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) வெளியீட்டின் ஒரு உருவாக்கத்தை முதலில் பயிற்ச முதலில் ஒரு பொருள் சங்கிலியின் வடிவத்தில் ஒரு உறுப்புப் பின்னர் beam தேடுதலை பயன்படுத்தி இந்த பொருள் சங்கிலியில் வைக்கப்பட்ட சிறந்த உரைய Name', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ساده لیکن اثرات طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کریں گے کہ اس سے پہلے سیٹوکسٹیک ڈاکوڈ استراتژی کے مقابلہ میں بہترین کیفیت کی نسل کے متفرق مختلف اثرات پیدا کریں. اس نے اچھی طرح کی پیشنهاد کی نئورل نسل کی مدل پر بنایا ہے (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) جو پہلی بار اپوٹٹ کے ایک کامپیوتر بنانے کے لئے آموزش کی جاتی ہیں اور پھر اس پر کنڈیسینگ اور اینٹ کے ذریعہ پیدا کیا جاتا ہے۔ ہمارا تقریبا ایک ایست زنجیر کی شکل میں ایک پیدائش کی نمونہ بنانے کے ذریعہ متن نازل ہونے سے منع کرتا ہے اور اس کے بعد بجلی تلاش کی استعمال کرتا ہے کہ اس ایست زنجیر کے ذریعہ سب سے بہترین ممکن متن پیدا کرے۔ (CNN/DailyMail and XSum) اور سوال نسل (SQuAD) کے بارے میں آزمائش، موجود اور نئی پیشنهاد کی استعمال کرتے ہیں', 'sr': 'Predlažemo uzorak kompozicije, jednostavan ali efikasan metod za stvaranje različitih ishoda za uvjetne generacije višeg kvaliteta u usporedbi sa prethodnim strategijama stokastičnog dekodiranja. On se osnova na nedavno predloženim modelima neuralne generacije na planu (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) koji su obučeni da prvo stvore kompoziciju proizvoda, a zatim stvore kondicionacijom na njemu i ulazu. Naš pristup izbjegava degeneraciju teksta prvim uzorakom kompozicije u obliku lanca entiteta i onda koristi pretragu zraka kako bi stvorili najbolji mogući tekst osnovan ovom lancu entiteta. Eksperimenti o sažetivanju (CNN/DailyMail i XSum) i generaciji pitanja (SQuAD), koristeći postojeće i novo predloženo automatsko', 'mt': 'Aħna nipproponu Kampjunar tal-Kompożizzjoni, metodu sempliċi iżda effettiv biex niġġeneraw riżultati varji għall-ġenerazzjoni kondizzjonali ta’ kwalità ogħla meta mqabbel ma’ strateġiji ta’ dekodifikazzjoni stokastika preċedenti. Hija tibni fuq mudelli ta’ ġenerazzjoni newrali bbażati reċentement fuq pjanijiet proposti (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) li huma mħarrġa biex l-ewwel joħolqu kompożizzjoni tal-output u mbagħad jiġġeneraw billi jikkondizzjonawha u l-input. L-approċċ tagħna jevita d-deġenerazzjoni tat-test billi l-ewwel jittieħed kampjun ta’ kompożizzjoni fil-form a ta’ katina tal-entità u mbagħad juża t-tiftix tar-raġġ biex jiġġenera l-a ħjar test possibbli bbażat fuq din il-katina tal-entità. Esperimenti dwar is-sommarju (CNN/DailyMail u XSum) u l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet (SQuAD), bl-użu ta’ awtomatiċi eżistenti u proposti ġodda', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề nghị Composition samling, một phương pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả để tạo ra các kết quả hoàn hảo cho hệ thống cấp cao hơn so với các chiến lược giải mã ngẫu nhiên trước. Nó xây dựng trên các mô hình thần kinh dựa trên kế hoạch mới nhất (quỹ Tây Ban Nha, Narayan et al, 2021) được huấn luyện để tạo ra đầu tiên một thành phần của kết xuất và sau đó tạo ra bằng cách điều chỉnh nó và nhập vào nó. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta tránh thoái hóa văn bản bằng cách lấy mẫu đầu tiên của một thành phần dưới dạng chuỗi thực thể và sau đó dùng ánh sáng tìm kiếm để tạo ra chữ viết tốt nhất có thể dựa trên chuỗi thực thể này. Thử nghiệm về tổng kết (CNN/Dailymail và XSum) và sản xuất câu hỏi (SCOAD), sử dụng hệ thống tự động đã có và mới được đề xuất.', 'uz': "Biz Kompyuterning misollarini tahlil qilamiz, oddiy va effektiv usuli, oldingi stokttik kodlash strategilarga kamaytirilgan bir xil taʼminotlarni yaratish darajadagi darajada o'xshash taʼminlovchilarni yaratish mumkin. Bu yaqinda tasavvur qilingan plan asosida neyrolik modellarini (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) yaratadi. Bu natijaning birinchi tuzuvni yaratish uchun o'rgandi va keyin uning holatni va kiritish bilan yaratish mumkin. Bizning usuli matn deganishni birinchi misol bilan birinchi narsalarni o'zgartiradi va keyin quyidagi narsalarning eng eng yaxshi matn chegini yaratish uchun qismni ishlatadi. Name", 'bg': 'Предлагаме съставно вземане на проби, прост, но ефективен метод за генериране на разнообразни изходи за условно генериране на по-високо качество в сравнение с предишните стохастични декодиращи стратегии. Тя се основава на наскоро предложени модели на невронно генериране, базирани на планове (ФРОСТ, Нараян и др., 2021), които са обучени първо да създадат състав на изхода и след това да генерират чрез кондициониране върху него и входа. Нашият подход избягва дегенерацията на текста, като първо взема проби от композиция под формата на верига на единици и след това използва търсене на лъчи, за да генерира възможно най-добрия текст, основан на тази верига на единици. Експерименти за обобщаване (CNN/DailyMail и XSum) и генериране на въпроси (SQuAD), използвайки съществуващи и новопредложени автоматични', 'hr': 'Predlažemo uzorak kompozicije, jednostavan ali učinkoviti metod za stvaranje različitih ishoda za uvjetne generacije višeg kvaliteta u usporedbi s prethodnim strategijama stokastičkog dekodiranja. On se temelji na nedavno predloženim modelima neuralne generacije na planu (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) koji su obučeni za prvi put stvoriti sastanak proizvoda, a zatim stvoriti kondicionacijom na njemu i ulazu. Naš pristup izbjegava degeneraciju teksta prvim uzorakom kompozicije u obliku lanca entiteta i onda koristi potragu za zrakom kako bi stvorili najbolji mogući tekst osnovan ovom lancu entiteta. Eksperimenti o sažetivanju (CNN/DailyMail i XSum) i generaciji pitanja (SQuAD), koristeći postojeće i novo predloženo automatsko', 'da': 'Vi foreslår Composition Sampling, en enkel, men effektiv metode til at generere forskellige output til betinget generering af højere kvalitet sammenlignet med tidligere stokastiske afkodningsstrategier. Det bygger på nyligt foreslåede planbaserede neurale generationsmodeller (FROST, Narayan et al., 2021), der er uddannet til først at skabe en sammensætning af output og derefter generere ved at konditionere det og input. Vores tilgang undgår tekst degeneration ved først at prøve en komposition i form af en entitetskæde og derefter bruge strålesøgning til at generere den bedst mulige tekst baseret på denne entitetskæde. Eksperimenter med opsummering (CNN/DailyMail og XSum) og spørgsmålstegnelse (SQUAD) ved hjælp af eksisterende og nyforeslåede automatiske', 'nl': 'We stellen Composition Sampling voor, een eenvoudige maar effectieve methode om diverse outputs te genereren voor voorwaardelijke generatie van hogere kwaliteit in vergelijking met eerdere stochastische decoderingsstrategieën. Het bouwt voort op recent voorgestelde plan-based neurale generatiemodellen (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) die getraind zijn om eerst een samenstelling van de output te creëren en vervolgens te genereren door er en de input op te conditioneren. Onze aanpak vermijdt tekstdegeneratie door eerst een compositie te bemonsteren in de vorm van een entiteitsketen en vervolgens beam search te gebruiken om de best mogelijke tekst te genereren gebaseerd op deze entiteitsketen. Experimenten op samenvatting (CNN/DailyMail en XSum) en vragengeneratie (SQuAD), met behulp van bestaande en nieuw voorgestelde automatische', 'de': 'Wir schlagen Composition Sampling vor, eine einfache, aber effektive Methode, um verschiedene Outputs für bedingte Erzeugung von höherer Qualität im Vergleich zu früheren stochastischen Dekodierungsstrategien zu generieren. Es baut auf kürzlich vorgeschlagenen planbasierten neuronalen Erzeugungsmodellen (FROST, Narayan et al., 2021) auf, die trainiert werden, zunächst eine Zusammensetzung des Outputs zu erstellen und dann durch Konditionierung darauf und des Inputs zu generieren. Unser Ansatz vermeidet Textdegeneration, indem wir zunächst eine Komposition in Form einer Entity Chain abtasten und dann mithilfe der Beam Search den bestmöglichen Text generieren, der auf diese Entity Chain basiert. Experimente zur Zusammenfassung (CNN/DailyMail und XSum) und Fragenerstellung (SQuAD), unter Verwendung vorhandener und neu vorgeschlagener automatischer', 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم نمونه\u200cهای ترکیب، یک روش ساده ولی موثر برای تولید نتیجه\u200cهای مختلف برای نسل\u200cهای شرایطی از کیفیت بالاتر در مقایسه با استراتژی\u200cهای دکوندن استاژیک پیشین. آن بر مدل\u200cهای نسل عصبی (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) که برای اولین بار آموزش داده می\u200cشود برای ایجاد ساختن یک ترکیب از نتیجه و سپس تولید می\u200cشود با شرایط روی آن و ورودش. دستور ما از نابود کردن متن با اولین نمونه\u200cای از طریق یک زنجیر entity و بعد از استفاده از جستجوی ابر برای تولید بهترین متن امکانات بر این زنجیر entity را فرا می\u200cگیرد. تجربه\u200cها در جریان\u200cسازی (CNN/DailyMail و XSum) و نسل سوال (SQuAD) با استفاده از موجود و تازه پیشنهاد automatic', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza Mfano wa Composition, njia rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi wa kutengeneza matokeo mbalimbali kwa kizazi cha hali ya juu ukilinganishwa na mikakati ya kuanguka kwa ukame. Inajenga kwenye mifano ya uzalishaji wa neura iliyopendeshwa hivi karibuni (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) ambayo imefundishwa kwa mara ya kwanza kutengeneza ujenzi wa matokeo na kisha kuzalisha kwa mazingira hayo na input. . ) Matokeo yetu yanajitenga na ongezeko la ujumbe wa maandishi kwa mfano wa kwanza katika mfumo wa mfumo wa entity na kisha kutumia utafutaji wa umeme ili kutengeneza ujumbe bora unaowezekana kwa mfungwa huu wa entity. Tatizo la kuhusiana na muhtasari (CNN/DailyMail na XSummer) na kizazi cha maswali (SQuAD), kwa kutumia kuwepo na mapendekezo mpya ya kujitegemea', 'af': "Ons voorstel Komposisie Versameling, 'n eenvoudige maar effektief metode om verskeie uitvoerdes te genereer vir voorwaardige generasie van hoër kwaliteit vergelyk met vorige stokastike dekoderingsstrategies. Dit bou op onlangs voorgestelde plangebaseerde neurale generasie modele (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) wat opgeleer word om eerste 'n komposisie van die uitvoer te skep en dan te genereer deur kondisiëring daarop en die invoer. Ons toegang veroorsaak teks degenerasie deur eerste versameling van 'n opsameling in die vorm van 'n entiteitketting en dan gebruik beam soektog om die beste moontlike teks te genereer wat agtergrond is na hierdie entiteitketting. Eksperimente op opsomming (CNN/DailyMail en XSum) en vraag generasie (SQuAD), gebruik bestaande en nuwe voorgestel automaties", 'tr': 'Şahsy örneklemesini basit ama etkili bir yöntem, soňky stohattik kodlama stratejilerine karşılaştırılýan soňky kalitede yüksek çözümler üretmek üçin çözümleri döretmek için çözümleri teklif ediyoruz. Häzirki gezek taýýarlanan planyň esasy taýýarlanan näyral generasiýa nusgalarynda (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) bu nusgalar ilkinji gezek output çykyşynyň bir kompozisyony bejermek üçin guruldy we soňra özüne condiziýar we girişi döretýär. Biziň ýaryşymyz birinji çyzgylyň şeklinde kompozisyon örän çykarmakdan çykar we soňra çyzgylyň aramasyny üçin bu entite zincirine süýtgetmek üçin iň gowy mümkin metin ýöredip ýöredir. Toparjyk (CNN/DailyMail we XSum) we soragy döredilmegi (SQuAD) ullanýan, bar we täze täze teklip eden awtomatik', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë zgjedhjen e kompozitave, një metodë të thjeshtë por efektive për të gjeneruar rezultate të ndryshme për gjenerimin e kushtueshëm të cilësisë më të lartë krahasuar me strategjitë e mëparshme të dekodimit stokastik. Ajo mbështetet në modelet e gjeneratës nervore të propozuara kohët e fundit me bazë në planin (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) që janë trajnuar së pari për të krijuar një përbërje të prodhimit dhe pastaj të gjeneruar duke kushtëzuar mbi të dhe input. Përqasja jonë shmangë degenerimin e tekstit duke marrë moshën e parë një kompozitë në form ën e zinxhirit të njësisë dhe pastaj duke përdorur kërkimin e rreze për të gjeneruar tekstin më të mirë të mundshëm bazuar në këtë zinxhir të njësisë. Eksperimentet mbi përmbledhjen (CNN/DailyMail dhe XSum) dhe gjenerimin e pyetjeve (SQuAD), duke përdorur automatike ekzistuese dhe të propozuara sapo', 'am': 'የቀድሞው የስታክስቲ ቀዳሚ ስርዓት በተደረገ ትክክል ትውልድ ላይ ለልዩ ልዩ ውጤቶችን ለማፍጠር ቀላል ግን ለጥያቄ ጥያቄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በቅርቢቱ ዘመን በፕሮግራም ላይ የተመሳሳይ የናውሬል ትውልድ model (FROST, ናራan et al, 2021) መጀመሪያ የውጤቱን አካባቢ መፍጠር እንዲያስተማሩና ከዚያም በኋላ በመግለጫው እና የውስጥ ጥያቄውን በመፍጠር ይሠራል፡፡ አካባቢ ሰንሰንሰለትን በመምሰል የጽሑፉን አካባቢ ማድረግ ይርቃል፡፡ የሥዕል ምርጫዎች', 'ko': '우리는 합성 표본 추출을 제기했는데 이것은 간단하지만 효과적인 방법으로 서로 다른 출력을 생성할 수 있고 이전의 랜덤 디코딩 전략에 비해 조건적으로 더욱 높은 품질의 결과를 생성할 수 있다.최근 제안된 계획 기반 신경 생성 모델(FROST, Narayan et al, 2021)을 토대로 이 모델은 훈련을 거쳐 출력의 구성을 먼저 만든 뒤 출력과 입력을 조절해 생성한다.우리의 방법은 먼저 실체 체인의 형식으로 합성을 샘플링한 다음에 beam 검색을 사용하여 이 실체 체인을 바탕으로 하는 가장 좋은 텍스트를 생성하여 텍스트의 퇴화를 피한다.기존 및 새로 제시된 자동 테스트 도구를 사용하여 요약(CNN/DailyMail 및 XSum) 및 문제 생성(SQuaD)을 실험합니다.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan Sampling Komposisi, metode sederhana tapi efektif untuk menghasilkan berbagai hasil untuk generasi kondisional kualitas yang lebih tinggi dibandingkan dengan strategi dekodasi stokastik sebelumnya. Ini dibangun pada model generasi saraf berasaskan rencana yang baru-baru ini diusulkan (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) yang dilatih untuk pertama membuat komposisi output dan kemudian menghasilkan dengan kondisi pada itu dan input. pendekatan kita menghindari degenerasi teks dengan mengambil sampel pertama komposisi dalam bentuk rantai entitas dan kemudian menggunakan pencarian sinar untuk menghasilkan teks terbaik yang mungkin didasarkan ke rantai entitas ini. Eksperimen pada ringkasan (CNN/DailyMail dan XSum) dan generasi pertanyaan (SQuAD), menggunakan otomatis yang ada dan yang baru diusulkan', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք համակարգչային նմուշներ վերցնել, մի պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ մեթոդ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք բազմազան արդյունքներ ավելի բարձր որակի պայմանավորված սերունդների համար, համեմատած նախորդ սթոշատիկ կոդավորման ռազ Այն հիմնված է վերջերս պլանի հիմնված նյարդային սերունդների մոդելների վրա (Frost, Նարայան և այլն, 2021 թվականին), որոնք ուսուցանված են առաջին անգամ ստեղծել արդյունքի կառուցվածքը և հետո ստեղծել այն պայմանավորման և ներմուծքի միջոցով: Մեր մոտեցումը խուսափում է տեքստի դեգեներացիային՝ առաջին անհատականության շղթայի տեսքով վերցնելով բաղադրությունը և հետո օգտագործելով ճառագայթի որոնումը, որպեսզի ստեղծենք այս անհատականության շղթայի վրա հիմնված ամենալավ Հարցողության համառոտագրման (CNN-DailyPost-ը և XSum-ը) և հարցերի ստեղծման (SQUADը) փորձերը, օգտագործելով գոյություն ունեցող և նորից առաջարկված ավտոմատիկ', 'az': 'Biz Composition Sampling təklif edirik, əvvəlki stochastik kodlama stratejiləri ilə qarşılaşdığı müxtəlif nəsillərin müxtəlif sonuçlarını yaratmaq üçün asanlıq, amma etkili bir yol. Bu, son zamanlarda təklif edilmiş plan-tabanlı nöral nəsil modellərinə (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) inşa edir. Bu, ilk dəfə çıxımın bir kompozisyonu yaratmaq üçün təhsil edilmişdir, sonra da ona və girişi təhsil edir. Bizim tərəfimiz mətn degenerasiyasından ilk dəstək zəncirlərinin forması ilə birləşdirilməsindən qaçır və sonra bu entitə zəncirlərinin ən yaxşı mümkün mətni yaratmaq üçün gəzm araştırmasını istifadə edir. Qıyıdırma (CNN/DailyMail və XSum) və sual nəzəriyyəti (SQuAD) barəsindəki təcrübələr, mevcut və yeni təklif edilən avtomatik olaraq istifadə edir.', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি পূর্ববর্তী স্টোক্সিক ডিকোডিং কৌশলের তুলনায় বিভিন্ন পরিমাণ প্রজন্মের জন্য বিভিন্ন ধরনের আউটপুট তৈরি করার একটি সহজ ক এটি সম্প্রতি প্রস্তাবিত পরিকল্পনা ভিত্তিক নিউরেল প্রজন্ম মডেল (ফ্রোস্ট, নারায়ান এন্ট আল, ২০২১) নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে যারা প্রথমে আউটপুটের একটি সংগঠন তৈরি কর Our approach avoids text degeneration by first sampling a composition in the form of an entity chain and then using beam search to generate the best possible text grounded to this entity chain.  বিদ্যমান এবং নতুন প্রস্তাবিত স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ব্যবহার করে (সিএনএন/ডেইলিমেইল এবং এক্সাম) এবং প্রশ্ন প্রজন্ম (SQuAD) সম্পর্কে পরীক্ষার', 'bs': 'Predlažemo uzorak kompozicije, jednostavan, ali efikasan metod za stvaranje različitih ishoda za uvjetne generacije višeg kvaliteta u usporedbi s prethodnim strategijama stokastičkog dekodiranja. On se temelji na nedavno predloženim modelima neuralne generacije na planu (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) koji su obučeni da prvo stvore kompoziciju proizvoda i onda stvore kondicionacijom na njemu i ulazu. Naš pristup izbjegava degeneraciju teksta prvim uzorakom kompozicije u obliku lanca entiteta i onda koristi pretragu zraka kako bi stvorili najbolji mogući tekst osnovan ovom lancu entiteta. Eksperimenti o sažetivanju (CNN/DailyMail i XSum) i generaciji pitanja (SQuAD), koristeći postojeće i novo predloženo automatsko', 'ca': "Proposem Composition Sampling, un mètode simple però eficaç per generar productes diversos per a generar condicionalment més alta qualitat comparat amb estratègies de decodificació estàstica anteriors. Se basa en models de generació neural basats en plas proposats recentment (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) que estan entrenats per crear primer una composició de la producció i generar després condicionant-la i la producció. El nostre enfocament evita la degeneració del text primer agafant mostres d'una composició en form a de cadena d'entitats i després utilitzant una cerca de raig per generar el millor text possible basat en aquesta cadena d'entitats. Els experiments de resum (CNN/DailyMail i XSum) i generació de preguntes (SQuAD), utilitzant les proposades automàtiques", 'cs': 'Navrhujeme Composition Sampling, jednoduchou, ale efektivní metodu generování různých výstupů pro podmíněnou generaci vyšší kvality ve srovnání s předchozími stochastickými dekódovacími strategiemi. Staví na nedávno navržených plánově založených neuronových generačních modelech (FROST, Narayan et al., 2021), které jsou trénovány nejprve vytvořit složení výstupu a poté generovat podmínkou na něm a vstupu. Náš přístup zabrání degeneraci textu tím, že nejprve vzorkujeme kompozici ve formě řetězce entit a následně využijeme vyhledávání paprsků k generování nejlepšího možného textu založeného na tomto řetězci entit. Experimenty na shrnutí (CNN/DailyMail a XSum) a generování otázek (SQuAD), pomocí stávajících a nově navržených automatických pokusů', 'et': 'Pakume välja kompositsiooniproovide võtmise, lihtsa, kuid tõhusa meetodi, et luua erinevaid väljundeid tingimuslikuks genereerimiseks kõrgema kvaliteediga võrreldes varasemate stohhastiliste dekodeerimisstrateegiatega. See põhineb hiljuti kavandatud plaanipõhistel närvigeneratsiooni mudelitel (FROST, Narayan jt, 2021), mis on koolitatud esmalt looma väljundi kompositsiooni ja seejärel genereerima selle ja sisendi konditsioneerimise teel. Meie lähenemisviis väldib teksti degeneratsiooni, võttes esmalt proovivõtte kompositsioonist olemusahela kujul ja kasutades seejärel kiirte otsingut, et luua parim võimalik tekst, mis põhineb sellel olemusahelal. Kokkuvõtliku koostamise (CNN/DailyMail ja XSum) ja küsimuste genereerimise katsed (SQuAD), kasutades olemasolevat ja äsja kavandatud automaatset', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme Composition Sampling -menetelmää, joka on yksinkertainen mutta tehokas menetelmä tuottaa erilaisia tuotoksia ehdolliseen tuotantoon, joka on laadukkaampi kuin aikaisemmat stokastiset dekoodatusstrategiat. Se perustuu hiljattain ehdotettuihin suunnitelmapohjaisiin neurogeneraatiomalleihin (FROST, Narayan ym., 2021), jotka on koulutettu luomaan ensin tuotoksen koostumus ja sitten tuottamaan ehdollistamalla sitä ja syötettä. Lähestymistapamme välttää tekstin rappeutumista ottamalla ensin näytteitä entiteettiketjun muodossa olevasta sommitelmasta ja sitten käyttämällä sädehakua luodaksemme parhaan mahdollisen tekstin pohjautuen tähän entiteettiketjuun. Kokeet yhteenvedosta (CNN/DailyMail ja XSum) ja kysymysten tuottamisesta (SQuAD) käyttäen olemassa olevia ja äskettäin ehdotettuja automaattisia menetelmiä', 'jv': 'Sampling Rasané mbukaké nggawe ing model sing paling-aké supayat karo sistem sing bisa nêraé (FLOSST, Narayan et al, 2020 1) sing dituruti cara-cara nggawe sampek mbiyen sampek tanggal nggawe output banjur ngetik gawe nguasai macem kuwi nggawe kayata sakjane lan ujarane mbukaké. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan kelas nang sampe tualke sampe aturan anyar tentang karo cadhaya Entisté Name', 'sk': 'Predlagamo sestavno vzorčenje, enostavno, a učinkovito metodo za ustvarjanje različnih rezultatov za pogojno generiranje višje kakovosti v primerjavi s prejšnjimi stohastičnimi dekodirnimi strategijami. Gradi na nedavno predlaganih modelih nevronske generacije, ki temeljijo na načrtu (FROST, Narayan et al., 2021), ki so usposobljeni, da najprej ustvarijo sestavo izhoda in nato ustvarijo s kondicioniranjem na njem in vhodu. Naš pristop preprečuje degeneracijo besedila tako, da najprej vzorčimo kompozicijo v obliki entitetne verige in nato z iskanjem žarka ustvarimo najboljše možno besedilo, ki temelji na tej entitetni verigi. Poskusi povzemanja (CNN/DailyMail in XSum) in ustvarjanja vprašanj (SQuAD), z uporabo obstoječih in na novo predlaganih avtomatskih', 'ha': "Tuna goyyar da Sami'in Composition, wata hanyoyi mai sauƙi kuma mai amfani da za'a ƙãga masu buƙata masu buƙata wa kizazi na sifanci da zaman canza kodi. It builds on recently proposed plan-based neural generation models (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) that are trained to first create a composition of the output and then generate by conditioning on it and the input.   Tsarakanmu na nĩsa sauri na matsayin da za'a sami ta farkon sami wani compositi cikin tsarin wani matsayi kuma a yi amfani da searching wa bũre dõmin ya ƙãga mafi kyaun matsayi wanda aka baka shi a kan wannan matsayi. KCharselect unicode block name", 'he': 'אנו מציעים דגימת התערבות, שיטה פשוטה אבל יעילה לייצר תוצאות מגוונות לדור מונחי של איכות גבוהה יותר בהשוואה לאסטרטגיות קידום סטוקסטיות קודמות. הוא בונה על דוגמנים של דור עצבי המבוססים על תוכניות לאחרונה (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) שאומרים לראשונה ליצור מייצור של ההוצאה ואז ליצור על ידי שימוש על זה והכניסה. Our approach avoids text degeneration by first sampling a composition in the form of an entity chain and then using beam search to generate the best possible text grounded to this entity chain.  ניסויים על סאמריזציה (CNN/DailyMail ו XSum) ודור שאלות (SQuAD), בשימוש באוטומטי קיים ומצע חדש', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མཛུབ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་སྟངས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་རྒྱུ་དང་། ལས་སྟབས་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་གནད་གནད་མི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ It builds on recently proposed plan-based neural generation models (FROST, Narayan et al, 2021) that are trained to first create a composition of the output and then generate by conditioning on it and the input. Our approach avoids text degeneration by first sampling a composition in the form of an entity chain and then using beam search to generate the best possible text grounded to this entity chain. Experiments on summarization (CNN/DailyMail and XSum) and question generation (SQuAD), using existing and newly proposed automatically'}
{'en': 'Entailment Graph Learning with Textual Entailment and Soft Transitivity', 'ar': 'تقدير قيمة السؤال التركيبي لتكييف المجال لإجابة السؤال', 'pt': 'Estimativa de valor de pergunta sintética para adaptação de domínio de resposta a perguntas', 'zh': '问答领会', 'fr': "Estimation synthétique de la valeur des questions pour l'adaptation au domaine des réponses aux questions", 'es': 'Estimación del valor de las preguntas sintéticas para la adaptación del dominio de la respuesta', 'hi': 'प्रश्न उत्तर देने के डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए सिंथेटिक प्रश्न मान अनुमान', 'ru': 'Оценка ценности синтетического вопроса для адаптации ответа на вопрос в области', 'ja': '質問回答のドメイン適応のための合成質問値推定', 'ga': 'Meastachán Luach Ceist Shintéiseach le haghaidh Oiriúnú Fearainn le Freagra Ceist', 'ka': 'სინტეტიკური კითხვის მნიშვნელობის განსაზღვრება კითხვის აეპტიფიკაციისთვის დომინის აეპტიფიკაციაName', 'hu': 'Szintetikus kérdésérték becslése a kérdések megválaszolásának domain adaptációjához', 'el': 'Συνθετική εκτίμηση τιμής ερωτήσεων για προσαρμογή τομέων της απάντησης ερωτήσεων', 'it': "Stima sintetica del valore delle domande per l'adattamento del dominio della risposta alle domande", 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауабының домен адаптациясының синтетикалық сұрақ мәнін бағалау', 'lt': 'Sintetinės klausimų vertės vertinimas, susijęs su klausimų atsakymo į klausimus pritaikymu dominuoju', 'mk': 'Проценка на синтетичката вредност на прашањата за адаптација на доменот на одговорите на прашањата', 'ms': 'Penghargaan Nilai soalan Sintetik untuk Penyesuaian Domain Jawapan soalan', 'mt': 'Stima tal-Valur tal-Mistoqsija Sintetika għall-Adattament tad-Dominju tat-Tweġibiet għall-Mistoqsijiet', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സിന്തിറ്റിക്ക് ചോദ്യം മൂല്യം', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн асуулт хариултын Домен Адаптацийн утгын тооцоолол', 'no': 'Evaluering av syntetiske spørjingsverdi for domenetilpassing av spørjingsverdi', 'pl': 'Syntetyczna oszacowanie wartości pytania dla adaptacji domeny odpowiedzi na pytania', 'ro': 'Estimarea valorii întrebărilor sintetice pentru adaptarea domeniului de răspuns la întrebări', 'sr': 'Procjena vrijednosti sintetičkog pitanja za adaptaciju domena odgovora na pitanja', 'ta': 'Domain Adaptation for Synthetic Query மதிப்பு கேள்வி பதில்', 'so': 'Qiimaynta mas’uulka la xiriira', 'sv': 'Syntetisk frågevärdering för domänanpassning av frågesvar', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාසයේ ඩොමේන් අනුමාණය සඳහා සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස', 'ur': 'سؤال جواب کے دامین اڈپٹیٹ کے لئے سینٹیک سؤال کی ارزش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giá trị câu hỏi tổng hợp giá trị định giá cho mái câu hỏi', 'bg': 'Синтетична оценка на стойността на въпросите за адаптиране на домейна на отговора на въпроси', 'nl': 'Synthetische schatting van vragenwaarde voor domeinaanpassing van vragenbeantwoording', 'hr': 'Procjena vrijednosti sintetičkog pitanja za prilagođenje domena odgovora na pitanje', 'da': 'Syntetisk spørgsmålsværdi estimat for domænetilpasning af spørgsmål besvarelse', 'de': 'Synthetische Schätzung des Fragenwertes für die Domänenanpassung der Fragebeantwortung', 'ko': '문답 영역에 적응하는 종합 문제치 추정에 사용', 'fa': 'ارزش سؤال سینتیک برای تغییرات دامنه جواب سوال', 'id': 'Perkiraan Nilai Pertanyaan Sintetis untuk Adaptasi Domain Jawaban Pertanyaan', 'sw': 'Hesabu ya Swali ya Kiunganiki kwa ajili ya Kupitia swali', 'tr': 'Sorag Jogapy üçin Senetik Sorag Mykdary Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Sintetiese Vrag Waarde Estimatie vir Domein Aanpassering van Vrag Antwoord', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi sintetik i vlerës së pyetjeve për përshtatjen e domenit të përgjigjeve të pyetjeve', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Սինթետիկ հարցերի արժեքի գնահատումը հարցերի պատասխանների դաշտի հարմարեցման համար', 'az': 'S칬yl톛 cavab verm톛si 칲칞칲n Domain Adfiksiyas캼 칲칞칲n Sintetik Soru Q캼ymeti N칬mr톛si', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের মান গণনা', 'bs': 'Procjena vrijednosti sintetičkog pitanja za adaptaciju domena odgovora na pitanje', 'ca': "Estimat de valor sintètic de preguntes per l'adaptació del domini de la resposta a preguntes", 'cs': 'Syntetický odhad hodnoty otázek pro doménovou adaptaci odpovědi na otázky', 'et': 'Sünteetilise küsimuse väärtuse hindamine domeeni kohandamiseks küsimustele vastamisel', 'fi': 'Synteettinen kysymys arvon arviointi verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseksi kysymyksiin vastaamiseen', 'he': 'הערכת ערך השאלות הסינטטית עבור ההתאמה למשטרה של תשובות לשאלות', 'sk': 'Ocena sintetične vrednosti vprašanj za prilagoditev domene odgovarjanja na vprašanja', 'ha': 'Kiimakon tambayar Kima na Tsuke wa Adaɗarwa', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'bo': 'Synthetic Question Value Estimation for Domain Adaptation of Question Answering'}
{'en': 'Typed entailment graphs try to learn the entailment relations between predicates from text and model them as edges between predicate nodes The construction of entailment graphs usually suffers from severe sparsity and unreliability of distributional similarity We propose a two stage method Entailment Graph with Textual Entailment and Transitivity EGT2 EGT2 learns the local entailment relations by recognizing the textual entailment between template sentences formed by typed CCG parsed predicates Based on the generated local graph EGT2 then uses three novel soft transitivity constraints to consider the logical transitivity in entailment structures Experiments on benchmark datasets show that EGT2 can well model the transitivity in entailment graph to alleviate the sparsity and leads to signifcant improvement over current state of the art methods', 'ar': 'أصبح تجميع أزواج ضمان الجودة مع منشئ الأسئلة (QG) في المجال الهدف نهجًا شائعًا لتكييف المجال لنماذج الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA). نظرًا لأن الأسئلة التركيبية غالبًا ما تكون صاخبة في الممارسة العملية ، فإن العمل الحالي يتكيف مع الدرجات من نموذج QA (أو QG) المحدد مسبقًا كمعايير لاختيار أسئلة عالية الجودة. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه الدرجات لا تخدم بشكل مباشر الهدف النهائي المتمثل في تحسين أداء ضمان الجودة في المجال المستهدف. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم فكرة جديدة لتدريب مقدر قيمة السؤال (QVE) الذي يقدّر بشكل مباشر فائدة الأسئلة التركيبية لتحسين أداء ضمان الجودة في المجال المستهدف. من خلال إجراء تجارب شاملة ، نظهر أن الأسئلة التركيبية المحددة بواسطة QVE يمكن أن تساعد في تحقيق أداء أفضل لضمان الجودة في المجال المستهدف ، مقارنة بالتقنيات الحالية. نوضح أيضًا أنه باستخدام مثل هذه الأسئلة وحوالي 15٪ فقط من التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية على المجال المستهدف ، يمكننا تحقيق أداء مشابه لخطوط الأساس الخاضعة للإشراف الكامل.', 'fr': "La synthèse de paires d'assurance qualité avec un générateur de questions (QG) sur le domaine cible est devenue une approche populaire pour l'adaptation au domaine des modèles de réponse aux questions (AQ). Étant donné que les questions synthétiques sont souvent bruyantes dans la pratique, les travaux existants adaptent les scores d'un modèle d'AQ (ou QG) préentraîné en tant que critères pour sélectionner des questions de haute qualité. Cependant, ces scores ne servent pas directement l'objectif final d'améliorer les performances d'assurance qualité sur le domaine cible. Dans cet article, nous présentons une nouvelle idée de formation d'un estimateur de valeur de question (QVE) qui estime directement l'utilité des questions synthétiques pour améliorer les performances d'AQ dans le domaine cible. En menant des expériences complètes, nous montrons que les questions synthétiques sélectionnées par QVE peuvent aider à obtenir de meilleures performances d'assurance qualité dans le domaine cible, par rapport aux techniques existantes. Nous montrons également qu'en utilisant de telles questions et seulement environ 15\xa0% des annotations humaines sur le domaine cible, nous pouvons atteindre des performances comparables aux lignes de base entièrement supervisées.", 'pt': 'Sintetizar pares de QA com um gerador de perguntas (QG) no domínio de destino tornou-se uma abordagem popular para adaptação de domínio de modelos de resposta a perguntas (QA). Como as perguntas sintéticas costumam ser barulhentas na prática, o trabalho existente adapta as pontuações de um modelo de QA (ou QG) pré-treinado como critério para selecionar perguntas de alta qualidade. No entanto, essas pontuações não atendem diretamente ao objetivo final de melhorar o desempenho do controle de qualidade no domínio-alvo. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma nova ideia de treinar um estimador de valor de pergunta (QVE) que estima diretamente a utilidade de perguntas sintéticas para melhorar o desempenho de QA do domínio-alvo. Ao conduzir experimentos abrangentes, mostramos que as perguntas sintéticas selecionadas pelo QVE podem ajudar a obter um melhor desempenho de controle de qualidade do domínio-alvo, em comparação com as técnicas existentes. Além disso, mostramos que, usando essas perguntas e apenas cerca de 15% das anotações humanas no domínio de destino, podemos obter um desempenho comparável às linhas de base totalmente supervisionadas.', 'es': 'La síntesis de pares de control de calidad con un generador de preguntas (QG) en el dominio objetivo se ha convertido en un enfoque popular para la adaptación de dominios de los modelos de respuesta a preguntas (QA). Dado que las preguntas sintéticas suelen ser ruidosas en la práctica, el trabajo existente adapta las puntuaciones de un modelo de control de calidad (o QG) previamente entrenado como criterio para seleccionar preguntas de alta calidad. Sin embargo, estas puntuaciones no cumplen directamente con el objetivo final de mejorar el rendimiento de la garantía de calidad en el dominio de destino. En este artículo, presentamos una idea novedosa de entrenar un estimador del valor de la pregunta (QVE) que estima directamente la utilidad de las preguntas sintéticas para mejorar el rendimiento de control de calidad del dominio objetivo. Al realizar experimentos exhaustivos, demostramos que las preguntas sintéticas seleccionadas por QVE pueden ayudar a lograr un mejor rendimiento de control de calidad del dominio objetivo, en comparación con las técnicas existentes. Además, demostramos que al usar estas preguntas y solo alrededor del 15% de las anotaciones humanas en el dominio de destino, podemos lograr un rendimiento comparable al de las líneas de base totalmente supervisadas.', 'zh': '域上用问生成器 (QG) 合 QA 对已成 (QA) 应域之流行方法。 由于合在实践中常嘈杂,故今有以预练之QA(、QQG)之分为择高质量之准。 然不能直成提高目标域质量检查绩效之最终目标。 本文引入一教料器(QVE)新意,当度器直度综核QA性有用性。 备实验以明术,QVE合以助善QA。 吾犹明之,因而用之,且以域上约15%人工注之,可得与全督基线相当也。', 'ru': 'Синтез пар QA с генератором вопросов (QG) в целевой области стал популярным подходом к адаптации моделей ответов на вопросы (QA). Поскольку синтетические вопросы часто шумят на практике, существующая работа адаптирует баллы из предварительно обученной модели QA (или QG) в качестве критериев для выбора высококачественных вопросов. Тем не менее, эти баллы напрямую не служат конечной цели повышения эффективности QA в целевой области. В этой статье мы представляем новую идею обучения оценщика стоимости вопросов (QVE), который непосредственно оценивает полезность синтетических вопросов для улучшения результативности QA в целевой области. Проводя всесторонние эксперименты, мы показываем, что синтетические вопросы, выбранные QVE, могут помочь достичь лучшей производительности QA в целевой области по сравнению с существующими методами. Мы дополнительно показываем, что с помощью таких вопросов и только около 15% человеческих аннотаций на целевом домене мы можем достичь сопоставимой производительности с полностью контролируемыми базовыми линиями.', 'hi': 'लक्ष्य डोमेन पर एक प्रश्न जनरेटर (QG) के साथ QA जोड़े को संश्लेषित करना प्रश्न उत्तर (QA) मॉडल के डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए एक लोकप्रिय दृष्टिकोण बन गया है। चूंकि सिंथेटिक प्रश्न अक्सर व्यवहार में शोर करते हैं, इसलिए मौजूदा काम उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले प्रश्नों का चयन करने के लिए मानदंड के रूप में एक पूर्वप्रशिक्षित क्यूए (या क्यूजी) मॉडल से स्कोर को अनुकूलित करता है। हालांकि, ये स्कोर सीधे लक्ष्य डोमेन पर QA प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के अंतिम लक्ष्य की सेवा नहीं करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक प्रश्न मूल्य अनुमानक (क्यूवीई) को प्रशिक्षित करने का एक उपन्यास विचार पेश करते हैं जो सीधे लक्ष्य-डोमेन क्यूए प्रदर्शन में सुधार के लिए सिंथेटिक प्रश्नों की उपयोगिता का अनुमान लगाता है। व्यापक प्रयोगों का संचालन करके, हम दिखाते हैं कि QVE द्वारा चुने गए सिंथेटिक प्रश्न मौजूदा तकनीकों की तुलना में बेहतर लक्ष्य-डोमेन QA प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करने में मदद कर सकते हैं। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि इस तरह के प्रश्नों का उपयोग करके और लक्ष्य डोमेन पर मानव एनोटेशन के केवल 15% के आसपास, हम पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित बेसलाइन के लिए तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त कर सकते हैं।', 'ja': 'QAペアをターゲットドメイン上の質問生成器（ QG ）と合成することは、質問応答（ QA ）モデルのドメイン適応のための一般的なアプローチとなっている。 合成的な質問は実際にはうるさいことが多いため、既存の作業では、事前に訓練されたQA （またはQG ）モデルからのスコアを基準として適応させ、質の高い質問を選択します。 しかしながら、これらのスコアは、ターゲットドメインのQAパフォーマンスを向上させるという最終的な目標を直接達成するものではありません。 本稿では， QAパフォーマンスを向上させるための合成問題の有用性を直接的に推定するQVE (question value estimatedator)を訓練するという斬新なアイデアを紹介する． 総合的な実験を実施することで、QVEが選択した合成問題は、既存の手法と比較して、より良いターゲットドメインQAパフォーマンスを達成するのに役立つことが示されています。 さらに、このような質問を使用し、ターゲットドメイン上の人間の注釈の約15 ％のみを使用することで、完全に監督されたベースラインと同等のパフォーマンスを達成できることを示しています。', 'ga': 'Is cur chuige coitianta anois é péirí QA a shintéisiú le gineadóir ceisteanna (QG) ar an spriocfhearann chun samhlacha freagartha ceisteanna (QA) a oiriúnú don fhearainn. Ós rud é go mbíonn ceisteanna sintéiseacha torannach go minic i gcleachtas, déanann obair atá ann cheana scóir ó mhúnla QA (nó QG) réamh-oilte a oiriúnú mar chritéir chun ceisteanna ardcháilíochta a roghnú. Mar sin féin, ní fhreastalaíonn na scóir seo go díreach ar an sprioc deiridh maidir le feidhmíocht QA a fheabhsú ar an spriocfhearann. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach smaoineamh nua maidir le hoiliúint a chur ar mheastóir luach ceisteanna (QVE) a dhéanann meastachán díreach ar a n-úsáidí atá ceisteanna sintéiseacha chun feidhmíocht QA na sprice a fheabhsú. Trí thurgnaimh chuimsitheacha a dhéanamh, léirímid gur féidir leis na ceisteanna sintéiseacha a roghnaíonn QVE cabhrú le feidhmíocht QA spriocfhearainn níos fearr a bhaint amach, i gcomparáid leis na teicnící atá ann cheana féin. Léirímid freisin, trí úsáid a bhaint as ceisteanna den sórt sin agus gan ach thart ar 15% de na nótaí daonna ar an spriocfhearann, gur féidir linn feidhmíocht inchomparáide a bhaint amach leis na bunlínte faoi mhaoirseacht iomlán.', 'hu': 'A kérdésrendezési modellek domain adaptációjának népszerű megközelítésévé vált a QA párok kérdésrendezési generátorral (QG) történő szintetizálása a céltartományon. Mivel a szintetikus kérdések gyakran zajosak a gyakorlatban, a meglévő munka kritériumaként igazítja a kiváló minőségű kérdések kiválasztásához szükséges pontszámokat egy előkészített QA (vagy QG) modellből. Ezek a pontszámok azonban nem szolgálják közvetlenül a végső célt, hogy javítsák a minőségbiztosítás teljesítményét a céltartományon. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy új ötletet egy kérdésértékbecslő (QVE) képzésére, amely közvetlenül becsüli a szintetikus kérdések hasznosságát a céltartomány minőségbecslési teljesítményének javításában. Átfogó kísérletek elvégzésével megmutatjuk, hogy a QVE által kiválasztott szintetikus kérdések segíthetnek a meglévő technikákkal összehasonlítva jobb céltartományi minőségi teljesítmény elérésében. Ezenkívül azt is megmutatjuk, hogy ilyen kérdésekkel és a céltartományon lévő emberi megjegyzések csak körülbelül 15%-ával hasonló teljesítményt tudunk elérni a teljes körűen felügyelt alapvonalakhoz.', 'el': 'Η σύνθεση ζευγαριών QA με μια γεννήτρια ερωτήσεων (QG) στον τομέα προορισμού έχει γίνει μια δημοφιλής προσέγγιση για την προσαρμογή προτύπων απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις (QA). Δεδομένου ότι οι συνθετικές ερωτήσεις είναι συχνά θορυβώδεις στην πράξη, η υπάρχουσα εργασία προσαρμόζει τις βαθμολογίες από ένα προκαθορισμένο μοντέλο QA (ή QG) ως κριτήρια για την επιλογή ερωτήσεων υψηλής ποιότητας. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι βαθμολογίες δεν εξυπηρετούν άμεσα τον τελικό στόχο της βελτίωσης της απόδοσης QS στον τομέα προορισμού. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια νέα ιδέα για την εκπαίδευση ενός εκτιμητή αξίας ερωτήσεων (QVE) που εκτιμά άμεσα τη χρησιμότητα των συνθετικών ερωτήσεων για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης της QA στον τομέα του στόχου. Διεξάγοντας ολοκληρωμένα πειράματα, καταδεικνύουμε ότι τα συνθετικά ερωτήματα που επιλέγει η QVE μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στην επίτευξη καλύτερης απόδοσης QA στον τομέα του στόχου, σε σύγκριση με τις υπάρχουσες τεχνικές. Επιπλέον, αποδεικνύουμε ότι με τη χρήση τέτοιων ερωτήσεων και μόνο περίπου 15% των ανθρώπινων σχολίων στον τομέα του στόχου, μπορούμε να επιτύχουμε συγκρίσιμη απόδοση με τις πλήρως εποπτευόμενες γραμμές βάσης.', 'ka': 'QA ზოგის სინტეზიზაცია კითხვის გენერატორი (QG) მისაწყისი დიომინში მოხდა პოლიოლური პროგრამი, რომელიც კითხვის აკაპეციაციის (QA) მოდელეების მოდულების დეომი სინტეტიკური კითხვები ზოგიერთად ხმარებულია პრაქტიკში, მხოლოდ სამუშაო სამუშაო მოდელიდან QA (ან QG) მოდელიდან აეპორტირებულია როგორც კრიტერიები, როგორ მაგრამ, ეს მონაცემები არ ექსექტურად უფლებს QA მონაცემების უფრო მეტივად მიზეზეზეზეზი დემომინში. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ შევცვალოთ პრომენტიური იდეა კითხვის მნიშვნელობის სტიმატორი (QVE), რომელიც მიერად განსაზღვრებას სინტეტიკური კითხვების გამოსაყენებელობას QA სამუშაო მონაცემების QVE მონიშნული სინტეტიკური კითხვები შეგვიძლია დახმარება უფრო უკეთესი სარგებონის QA პროცემენტის გავაკეთებას, რომელიც არსებობს ტექნექციების შემდეგ. ჩვენ დამატებით ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ასეთი კითხვების გამოყენებით და მხოლოდ 15% ადამიანის ანოტაციების მიხედვილი დიომინში, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ შესაბამისი გამოყენება ყველაფ', 'it': "Sintetizzare le coppie di QA con un generatore di domande (QG) sul dominio di destinazione è diventato un approccio popolare per l'adattamento del dominio dei modelli di risposta alle domande (QA). Poiché le domande sintetiche sono spesso rumorose nella pratica, il lavoro esistente adatta i punteggi di un modello di QA (o QG) pre-addestrato come criteri per selezionare domande di alta qualità. Tuttavia, questi punteggi non servono direttamente all'obiettivo finale di migliorare le prestazioni di QA sul dominio di destinazione. In questo articolo, introduciamo una nuova idea di formare un question value estimator (QVE) che valuta direttamente l'utilità delle domande sintetiche per migliorare le prestazioni di QA del dominio target. Conducendo esperimenti completi, mostriamo che le domande sintetiche selezionate da QVE possono aiutare a ottenere migliori prestazioni QA del dominio target, rispetto alle tecniche esistenti. Dimostriamo inoltre che utilizzando tali domande e solo circa il 15% delle annotazioni umane sul dominio di destinazione, possiamo ottenere prestazioni paragonabili alle linee di base completamente supervisionate.", 'lt': 'QA porų sintezavimas su klausimų generatoriumi (QG) tikslinėje srityje tapo populiariu požiūriu į klausimų atsakymo modelių pritaikymą domeniui. Since synthetic questions are often noisy in practice, existing work adapts scores from a pretrained QA (or QG) model as criteria to select high-quality questions.  Tačiau šie rezultatai nėra tiesiogiai susiję su galutiniu tikslu gerinti QA rezultatus tikslinėje srityje. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują idėją mokyti klausimų vertės įvertinėją (QVE), kuris tiesiogiai įvertina sintetinių klausimų naudingumą siekiant pagerinti tikslinės srities QA rezultatus. Atlikdami išsamius eksperimentus parodome, kad QVE pasirinkti sintetiniai klausimai gali padėti pasiekti geresnius tikslinės srities QA rezultatus, palyginti su esamais metodais. Be to, mes rodome, kad naudojant tokius klausimus ir tik apie 15 proc. žmogaus pastabų tikslinėje srityje galime pasiekti panašius rezultatus kaip ir visiškai prižiūrimos bazinės linijos.', 'ms': 'Menyegerakkan pasangan QA dengan generator soalan (QG) pada domain sasaran telah menjadi pendekatan popular untuk penyesuaian domain bagi model jawapan soalan (QA). Kerana soalan sintetik sering bunyi dalam latihan, kerja sedia ada menyesuaikan skor dari model QA (atau QG) yang dilatih dahulu sebagai kriteria untuk memilih soalan kualiti tinggi. Namun, skor ini tidak secara langsung melayani tujuan utama untuk meningkatkan prestasi QA pada domain sasaran. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan idea baru untuk melatih penghargaan nilai soalan (QVE) yang secara langsung menghargai kebaikan soalan sintetik untuk meningkatkan prestasi QA sasaran-domain. Dengan melakukan eksperimen yang meliputi, kami menunjukkan bahawa soalan sintetik yang dipilih oleh QVE boleh membantu mencapai prestasi QA sasaran-domain yang lebih baik, dibandingkan dengan teknik yang ada. Kami tambahan menunjukkan bahawa dengan menggunakan soalan seperti itu dan hanya sekitar 15% anotasi manusia pada domain sasaran, kita boleh mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan garis dasar yang diawasi sepenuhnya.', 'mk': 'Синтезирањето на парови QA со генератор на прашања (QG) на доменот на целта стана популарен пристап за адаптација на доменот на моделите на одговор на прашања (QA). Бидејќи синтетичките прашања честопати се бучни во практиката, постоечката работа ги адаптира резултатите од предобучениот модел на QA (или QG) како критериуми за избор на висококвалитетни прашања. Сепак, овие резултати не служат директно на крајната цел да се подобри резултатот на QA во доменот на целта. Во овој весник, воведуваме нова идеја за обука на проценувач на вредност на прашањето (QVE) кој директно ја проценува корисноста на синтетичките прашања за подобрување на резултатот на QA на цел-домен. Со спроведување на сеопфатни експерименти, покажуваме дека синтетичките прашања избрани од QVE можат да помогнат во постигнувањето подобра резултат на QA на цел-домен, во споредба со постојните техники. Дополнително покажуваме дека со користење на вакви прашања и само околу 15 отсто од човечките анотации на доменот на целта, можеме да постигнеме споредливи резултати со целосно надгледуваните основни линии.', 'kk': 'QA екі сұрақ генераторымен (QG) синтезация мақсатты доменде сұрақ (QA) моделдерінің (доменге) жауап беретін моделдерінің доменге қолдану үшін қолданыстар болды. Синтетикалық сұрақтар көбінесе тәжірибеде дыбыс болғандықтан, барлық жұмыс QA (не QG) үлгісінен көбінесе жоғары сапатты сұрақтарды таңдау үшін критериялар ретінде жасайды. Бірақ бұл нәтижелер мақсатты доменде QA жылдамдығын жақсарту үшін аяқталмаған мақсатты емес. Бұл қағазда, QA дегенді жақсарту үшін синтетикалық сұрақтардың пайдалығын дұрыс бағалайтын сұрақ оқыту идеясын таңдап береміз. QVE таңдалған синтетикалық сұрақтар QA дегеннің жақсы мақсатты доменге салыстыру үшін көмектеседі. Сонымен біз осы сұрақтарды қолдануға және мақсатты домендегі адамдардың 15% жаңалықтарын қолдануға болады. Біз толық бақылаған негізгі жолдарымызға салыстыра аламыз.', 'ml': 'ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d ചോദ്യ ജെനററെറ്റര്\u200d ഉള്ള ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ആഡേപ്റ്റേ സിന്തിറ്റിക്ക് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും ശബ്ദമുണ്ട്, നിലവിലുള്ള ജോലിയുടെ സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച കിയായ എന്നാലും ഈ സ്കോര്\u200dസ് നേരിട്ട് സേവിക്കുന്നില്ല, ലക്ഷ്യം ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d ക്യൂഎ പ്രദര്\u200dശനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഐഡിയ യാണ് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ മൂല്യം എസ്റ്റിമേറ്ററിനെ (QVE) പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതെന്ന്  പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ക്യൂവേവില്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത സിന്റെറ്റിക്ക് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നിലവിലുള്ള ടെക്ക ഇത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d 15% മാത്രം മനുഷ്യരുടെ അഭിപ്രായം മാത്രമേ നമുക്ക് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി ന', 'mt': 'Is-sintetizzazzjoni ta’ pari QA ma’ ġeneratur ta’ mistoqsijiet (QG) fuq id-dominju fil-mira saret approċċ popolari għall-adattament tad-dominju tal-mudelli tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA). Billi l-mistoqsijiet sintetiċi spiss ikunu storbjużi fil-prattika, ix-xogħol eżistenti jadatta l-punteġġi minn mudell QA (jew QG) imħarreġ minn qabel bħala kriterji biex jintgħa żlu mistoqsijiet ta’ kwalità għolja. Madankollu, dawn il-punteġġi ma jservux direttament għall-għan aħħari li titjieb il-prestazzjoni tal-QA fid-dominju fil-mira. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu idea ġdida ta’ taħriġ ta’ stimatur tal-valur tal-mistoqsijiet (QVE) li jistma direttament l-utilità ta’ mistoqsijiet sintetiċi għat-titjib tal-prestazzjoni tal-QA fid-dominju fil-mira. Permezz tat-twettiq ta’ esperimenti komprensivi, nuru li l-mistoqsijiet sintetiċi magħżula mill-QVE jistgħu jgħinu biex tinkiseb prestazzjoni aħjar tal-QA fid-dominju fil-mira, meta mqabbla mat-tekniki eżistenti. Barra minn hekk, nuru li billi nużaw mistoqsijiet bħal dawn u biss madwar 15% tal-annotazzjonijiet umani fuq id-dominju fil-mira, nistgħu niksbu prestazzjoni komparabbli mal-linji bażi ssorveljati bis-sħiħ.', 'no': 'Syntetisering av QA- par med eit spørsmålgener (QG) på måldområdet har blitt eit populært tilnærming for domenetilpassing av spørsmål svarande (QA) modeller. Sidan syntetiske spørsmål ofte er støy i praksis, tilpassar det eksisterande arbeidet poeng frå eit første QA (eller QG) modell som kriterier for å velja høg kvalitet spørsmål. Desse poeng er imidlertid ikkje direkte tilgjengeleg det ultime målet å forbetra QA-utviklinga på måldområdet. I denne papiret introduserer vi eit nytt idee om å opplæra eit opplæringsverdiestimator (QVE) som direkte vurder at syntetiske spørsmål er nyttig for å forbetra målgområdet QA. Ved å gjera komplette eksperimenter viser vi at syntetiske spørsmål som er valde av QVE kan hjelpa til å gjera bedre målgdomenet QA-utvikling i sammenligning med eksisterande teknikk. I tillegg viser vi at ved å bruka slike spørsmål og berre rundt 15 % av menneskelige notasjonane på målgområdet kan vi oppnå sammenlignbare utvikling med de fullstendige oversikte baselinjene.', 'pl': 'Syntezowanie par QA z generatorem pytań (QG) w domenie docelowej stało się popularnym podejściem do adaptacji domeny modeli odpowiedzi na pytania (QA). Ponieważ pytania syntetyczne są często hałaśliwe w praktyce, istniejące prace dostosowują wyniki z wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu QA (lub QG) jako kryteria do wyboru pytań wysokiej jakości. Wyniki te nie służą jednak bezpośrednio ostatecznemu celowi, jakim jest poprawa wydajności jakości w domenie docelowej. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowatorską ideę szkolenia szacunku wartości pytań (QVE), który bezpośrednio oszacowuje przydatność pytań syntetycznych do poprawy wydajności jakości w domenie docelowej. Przeprowadzając kompleksowe eksperymenty, pokazujemy, że pytania syntetyczne wybrane przez QVE mogą pomóc osiągnąć lepszą wydajność jakości w domenie docelowej w porównaniu z istniejącymi technikami. Dodatkowo pokazujemy, że stosując takie pytania i tylko około 15% adnotacji ludzkich w domenie docelowej, możemy osiągnąć porównywalną wydajność do w pełni nadzorowanych linii bazowych.', 'mn': 'QA хоёрыг нэг асуулт үүсгэгч (QG) зорилготой холбоотой холбоотой нь асуулт хариултын (QA) загварын зохицох холбоотой зорилго болсон. Синтетик асуултууд дасгал хөдөлгөөнд ихэвчлэн чимээгүй болсон учраас оршин байгаа ажил өндөр чанартай асуултуудыг сонгох шаардлагатай QA (эсвэл QG) загвараас үзүүлсэн тоонуудыг адаптацируулдаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр тоонууд шууд QA-ын үйл ажиллагааг зориулах зорилго нь шууд ашиглахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид асуулт үнэ цэнэтэй оюутнуудыг суралцах шинэ санааг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь QA зорилгооны үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд синтетик асуултуудын хэрэгжүүлэгдлийг шууд тодорхойлж байна. Бүтэн туршилтуудыг хийснээр QVE-ын сонгогдсон синтетик асуултууд QA-ын илүү сайн зорилготой зорилготой үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн бид ийм асуултуудыг ашиглан зорилготой хүн төрөлхтний 15 хувь нь зөвхөн хэрэглэгдсэн суурь шугам дээр харьцуулж чадна.', 'ro': 'Sintetizarea perechilor de QA cu un generator de întrebări (QG) pe domeniul țintă a devenit o abordare populară pentru adaptarea domeniului a modelelor de răspuns la întrebări (QA). Deoarece întrebările sintetice sunt adesea zgomotoase în practică, lucrările existente adaptează scorurile dintr-un model de QA (sau QG) pre-instruit ca criterii pentru a selecta întrebări de înaltă calitate. Cu toate acestea, aceste scoruri nu servesc direct obiectivului final de a îmbunătăți performanța QA pe domeniul țintă. În această lucrare, introducem o idee nouă de formare a unui estimator de valoare a întrebărilor (QVE) care estimează direct utilitatea întrebărilor sintetice pentru îmbunătățirea performanței QA a domeniului țintă. Prin efectuarea de experimente cuprinzătoare, arătăm că întrebările sintetice selectate de QVE pot ajuta la obținerea unei performanțe mai bune de QA în domeniul țintă, în comparație cu tehnicile existente. În plus, demonstrăm că folosind astfel de întrebări și doar aproximativ 15% din adnotările umane pe domeniul țintă, putem obține performanțe comparabile cu liniile de bază complet supravegheate.', 'sr': 'Sintetizacija par QA sa generatorom pitanja (QG) na ciljnom domenu postala je popularan pristup domenu adaptacije modela odgovora na pitanja (QA). Budući da su sintetičke pitanja često bučne u praksi, postojeći rad prilagođuje rezultate iz model a pretreniranog QA (ili QG) kao kriterije za izabranje visokokvalitetnih pitanja. Međutim, ovi rezultati ne služe direktno krajnjem cilju poboljšanja učinka QA na ciljnom domenu. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu ideju o obuci procjene vrijednosti pitanja (QVE), koja direktno procenjuje korisnost sintetičkih pitanja za poboljšanje izvršnosti ciljnog domena QA. Provodeći sveobuhvatni eksperimenti pokazujemo da sintetična pitanja koju je odabrala QVE može pomoći ostvariti bolju izvršnost ciljne domene QA u usporedbi sa postojećim tehnikama. Dodatno pokazujemo da koristeći takva pitanja i samo oko 15% ljudskih annotacija na ciljnom domenu možemo postići usporedno provedbe sa potpuno nadziranim osnovnim linijama.', 'si': 'QA දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ජේනර්ටර් එක්ක (QG) ලක්ෂණ ඩෝමේන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා සංවිධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට විශ්වාස කරනවා නිසා, ඉතින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න නමුත්, මේ ස්කෝර්ට් සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ නැහැ අන්තිම අරක්ෂාව QA ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ කරන්නේ ඉලක්ෂාත්මක මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස (QVE) කිරීමේ නියම අදහසක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කිය සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ QVE වල තෝරාගෙන තෝරාගෙන තියෙන සින්ටෙටික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොඳ ඉලක්ෂණ- ඩොමේන්  අපි තවත් පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්න භාවිත කරලා මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරශ්න 15% විතරයි ඉලක්ෂාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, අපිට පුළු', 'so': "QA labo la wada ururiyo oo la soo saaray wax su'aal ah (QG) oo ku qoran domain goalka ayaa u noqday qaab maaruf ah oo loo beddelo sameynta su'aalaha su'aalaha (QA). Sida darteed su'aalaha heshiisiintu ay inta badan ka qaylyaan tababarka, shaqada oo jiraana waxaa loo bedelaa koorasyo ka mid ah qaababka QA (ama QG) oo loo doorto su'aalaha takhasuska sare. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, scorahaas si toos ah uma adeegaan goalka ugu dambeeya ee horumarinta sameynta QA ee goobta goalka la jeedo. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaynaa fikrad warqad ah oo ku tababarinta qiimaha qiimaha (QVE) oo si toos ah u qiimeynaya faa'iidada su'aalaha heshiiska ee horumarinta muuqashada QA. By conducting comprehensive experiments, we show that the synthetic questions selected by QVE can help achieve better target-domain QA performance, in comparison with existing techniques.  Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in lagu isticmaalo su'aalahan oo kaliya 15% oo ka mid ah warqadaha dadka ee goobta goalka ah, waxaynu gaadhi karnaa bandhigyo u eg sameynta saldhigyada la ilaaliyay.", 'sv': 'Syntetisera QA-par med en frågegenerator (QG) på måldomänen har blivit ett populärt tillvägagångssätt för domänanpassning av frågesvarsmodeller. Eftersom syntetiska frågor ofta är bullriga i praktiken anpassar befintligt arbete poäng från en förutbestämd QA (eller QG) modell som kriterier för att välja högkvalitativa frågor. Dessa poäng tjänar dock inte direkt det slutliga målet att förbättra kvaliteten på måldomänen. I denna uppsats introducerar vi en ny idé om att träna en frågevärdesestimator (QVE) som direkt uppskattar nyttan av syntetiska frågor för att förbättra måldomänens QA-prestanda. Genom att genomföra omfattande experiment visar vi att de syntetiska frågor som valts av QVE kan bidra till att uppnå bättre måldomän QA prestanda, jämfört med befintliga tekniker. Vi visar också att genom att använda sådana frågor och endast cirka 15% av de mänskliga kommentarerna på måldomänen kan vi uppnå jämförbara resultat med de fullt övervakade baslinjerna.', 'ta': 'இலக்கு களத்தில் கேள்வி உருவாக்கியுடன் QA ஜோடிகளை ஒன்றிணைக்கும் கேள்வி பதில் மாதிரிகளின் பதில் (QA) மாதிரிகளுக்கு ஒரு பிரபலமான தொடர்புடைய கேள்விகள் பெரும்பாலும் பயிற்சியில் ஒலியாக இருக்கும் போது, தற்போதைய வேலை புள்ளிகளை ஏற்றுக்கொள்கிறது முன்னோ எனினும், இந்த புள்ளிகள் குறிப்பு தளத்தில் QA செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு நேரடியாக சேவைக்காது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், கேள்வி மதிப்பு மதிப்பு மதிப்பு மதிப்பீடு (QVE) பயிற்சியை ஒரு புதிய ய யோசனை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது கேள்வி மதிப்பை மேம்படு சூழ்நிலையான சோதனைகளைச் செய்து, QVE தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகள் சிறந்த இலக்கு- களம் QA செயல்பாட்டை பெற உதவ முடியும் என்பதை காட்டுக கூடுதலாக இந்த கேள்விகளை பயன்படுத்தி காட்டுகிறோம் மற்றும் இலக்கு களத்தில் முழு கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட அடிக்கோடுகளுக்கு மட்டும் 15% மனித விளக', 'ur': 'QA جوڑوں کے ساتھ ایک سوال جینراٹر (QG) کے ساتھ سینٹیزی کرنا موقع ڈومین میں سوال جواب دینے کے (QA) موڈل کے لئے ایک محبوب طریقہ ہو گیا ہے۔ اس وجہ سے کہ سینٹیٹیک سؤال اکثر آزمائش میں آواز لگتے ہیں، موجود کام ایک ایسی QA (یا QG) موڈل سے اسکور کو اچھی کیفیت سؤال کا انتخاب کرنے کے لئے منصوبات کے طور پر اضافہ کرتا ہے. However, these scores do not directly serve the ultimate goal of improving QA performance on the target domain. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک جوانی ایڈیون کو ایک سوال کے ارزش کا مطابق (QVE) کی تعلیم دیتے ہیں جو مستقیماً سینٹیسی سوال کے فائدہ کا مطابق ہے تابع-ڈومین کے QA عملکرد کی improving کے لئے۔ ہم تمام تجربیات کے ذریعے دکھاتے ہیں کہ QVE کے ذریعے انتخاب کئے ہوئے سینٹیٹیک سؤال اچھے ٹلوٹ ڈومین QA پرورشش کو پہنچانے کی مدد کر سکتے ہیں، موجود تکنیک کے مقابلہ میں. ہم اضافہ طور پر نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ایسے سوالات کے استعمال سے اور صرف مالک ڈومین کے 15 فیصد انسان کے علائم کے استعمال سے، ہم پورے نظارت کی بنسلین کے ساتھ برابری کا کام پہنچا سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Chunki synthetik savollari ko'p holatda yomon, mavjud vazifalar yuqori QA (yoki QG) modelidan yuqori darajalarni tanlash uchun qoidalarni moslash mumkin. However, these scores do not directly serve the ultimate goal of improving QA performance on the target domain.  Bu qogʻozda, biz savol qiymatning qiymati qiymati (QVE) qiymatini o'rganadigan novel fikrini anglatamiz. Bu qogʻoz soʻzlarning foydalanishini aniqlaydi. Muddati tajribalarni bajarish orqali biz QVE tanlangan synthetik savollarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, mavjud teknikalar bilan birga ega foydalanish mumkin. Ko'pchilik esa bu savollarni ishlatish bilan faqat 15% inson tajribalari davomida, biz butun taʼminlov qilingan asboblarga o'xshash bajarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Nhân hợp QA với một máy tạo câu hỏi (QG) trên miền đích đã trở thành một phương pháp ưa thích cho việc xử lý miền của các mô hình trả lời câu hỏi (QA). Do các câu hỏi tổng hợp thường ồn ào trong thực tế, công việc hiện tại thích hợp điểm từ mô hình QA hay QG như tiêu chuẩn để chọn câu hỏi chất lượng cao. Tuy nhiên, những điểm này không trực tiếp phục vụ mục tiêu cuối cùng của việc cải thiện năng lượng cá nhân trong lĩnh vực đích. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một ý tưởng mới về huấn luyện một người đánh giá giá giá giá nghi vấn (QV) mà đánh giá trực tiếp sự hữu ích của các câu hỏi tổng hợp để nâng cao khả năng đạt mục tiêu... Bằng cách tiến hành thí nghiệm toàn diện, chúng tôi cho thấy các câu hỏi tổng hợp được chọn bởi QV có thể giúp đạt hiệu suất QA đúng chuyên mục tiêu hơn so với các kỹ thuật đã có. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy bằng cách sử dụng những câu hỏi như thế và chỉ khoảng 15. của các ghi chú con người trên miền đích, chúng tôi có thể đạt được hiệu quả tương đương với các bản nền được giám sát đầy đủ.', 'bg': 'Синтезирането на двойки с генератор на въпроси (КГ) в целевия домейн се превърна в популярен подход за адаптиране на домейна на модели за отговор на въпроси (КВ). Тъй като синтетичните въпроси често са шумни на практика, съществуващата работа адаптира оценките от предварително трениран модел за оценка на качеството като критерии за избор на висококачествени въпроси. Тези резултати обаче не служат пряко на крайната цел за подобряване на ефективността на качеството в целевата област. В тази статия представяме нова идея за обучение на оценител на стойността на въпросите, който пряко оценява полезността на синтетичните въпроси за подобряване на изпълнението на целевата област. Чрез провеждането на изчерпателни експерименти, ние показваме, че синтетичните въпроси, избрани от КВО, могат да помогнат за постигането на по-добри резултати в целевата област в сравнение със съществуващите техники. Освен това показваме, че като използваме такива въпроси и само около 15% от човешките анотации в целевата област, можем да постигнем сравнима производителност с напълно контролираните базови линии.', 'nl': 'Het synthetiseren van QA-paren met een vragengenerator (QG) op het doeldomein is uitgegroeid tot een populaire benadering voor domeinaanpassing van vragenantwoordmodellen (QA). Omdat synthetische vragen in de praktijk vaak lawaaierig zijn, past bestaand werk scores van een vooraf getraind QA (of QG) model aan als criteria om vragen van hoge kwaliteit te selecteren. Deze scores dienen echter niet direct het uiteindelijke doel om de QA-prestaties op het doeldomein te verbeteren. In dit artikel introduceren we een nieuw idee van het trainen van een vraagwaardeschatter (QVE) die het nut van synthetische vragen direct schat voor het verbeteren van de QA-prestaties van het doeldomein. Door uitgebreide experimenten uit te voeren, laten we zien dat de synthetische vragen geselecteerd door QVE kunnen helpen om betere QA prestaties op het doeldomein te bereiken, in vergelijking met bestaande technieken. Daarnaast tonen we aan dat we met behulp van dergelijke vragen en slechts rond 15% van de menselijke annotaties op het doeldomein vergelijkbare prestaties kunnen behalen als de volledig begeleide baselines.', 'da': 'Synthesizering af QA-par med en spørgsmålsgenerator (QG) på måldomænet er blevet en populær tilgang til domænetilpasning af spørgsmålsbesvarelsesmodeller. Da syntetiske spørgsmål ofte er støjende i praksis, tilpasser eksisterende arbejde scoringer fra en forudtrænet QA (eller QG) model som kriterier for at vælge spørgsmål af høj kvalitet. Disse scorer tjener dog ikke direkte det endelige mål om at forbedre QA-ydeevnen på måldomænet. I denne artikel introducerer vi en ny idé om at træne en spørgsmålsværdiestimator (QVE), der direkte estimerer nytten af syntetiske spørgsmål til at forbedre måldomænets QA-præstation. Ved at udføre omfattende eksperimenter viser vi, at de syntetiske spørgsmål, som QVE har valgt, kan hjælpe med at opnå bedre måldomænet QA ydeevne sammenlignet med eksisterende teknikker. Vi viser desuden, at vi ved at bruge sådanne spørgsmål og kun omkring 15% af de menneskelige noteringer på måldomænet kan opnå sammenlignelige resultater med de fuldt overvågede basislinjer.', 'hr': 'Sintetizacija par QA-a sa generatorom pitanja (QG) na ciljnom domenu postala je popularan pristup domenu adaptacije modela odgovora na pitanja (QA). Budući da su sintetičke pitanja često bučne u praksi, postojeći rad prilagođuje rezultate iz model a pretkišenog QA (ili QG) kao kriterije za izabrati visoke kvalitetne pitanja. Međutim, ovi rezultati ne služe direktno krajnjem cilju poboljšanja učinka QA-a na ciljnom domenu. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu ideju o obuci procjene vrijednosti pitanja (QVE), koja izravno procjenjuje korisnost sintetičkih pitanja za poboljšanje učinka ciljnog domena QA. Provodeći sveobuhvatni eksperimenti pokazujemo da sintetička pitanja odabrana QVE-om mogu pomoći postići bolji učinkovit ciljnog domena QA u usporedbi s postojećim tehnikama. Dodatno pokazujemo da koristeći takva pitanja i samo oko 15% ljudskih annotacija na ciljnom domenu možemo postići usporedno provedbe s potpuno nadziranim osnovnim linijama.', 'de': 'Die Synthese von QA-Paaren mit einem Fragegenerator (QG) auf der Zieldomäne hat sich zu einem beliebten Ansatz für die Domänenanpassung von Fragebeantwortungsmodellen (QA) entwickelt. Da synthetische Fragen in der Praxis oft laut sind, passen bestehende Arbeiten Scores aus einem vortrainierten QA (oder QG) Modell als Kriterien an, um qualitativ hochwertige Fragen auszuwählen. Diese Scores dienen jedoch nicht direkt dem ultimativen Ziel, die QA-Leistung in der Zieldomäne zu verbessern. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine neuartige Idee vor, einen Fragewert-Schätzer (QVE) zu trainieren, der direkt die Nützlichkeit synthetischer Fragen zur Verbesserung der QA-Leistung im Zielbereich schätzt. Durch die Durchführung umfassender Experimente zeigen wir, dass die von QVE ausgewählten synthetischen Fragestellungen im Vergleich zu bestehenden Techniken zu einer besseren QA-Leistung im Zielbereich beitragen können. Zusätzlich zeigen wir, dass wir durch die Verwendung solcher Fragen und nur etwa 15% der menschlichen Annotationen auf der Zieldomäne eine vergleichbare Performance mit den vollständig überwachten Baselines erzielen können.', 'ko': '목표 영역에서 질문 생성기(QG)로 QA를 합성하여 이미 퀴즈(QA) 모델 영역에 적응하는 상용 방법이 되었다.합성 문제는 실천 과정에서 종종 시끄럽기 때문에 기존의 작업은 미리 훈련된 QA(또는QG) 모델의 점수를 고품질 문제를 선택하는 기준으로 삼는다.그러나 이 점수는 목표 분야의 QA 실적을 높이는 최종 목표에 직접적으로 쓰일 수 없다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 아이디어를 도입했다. 즉, 문제치 평가기(QVE)를 훈련시키는 것이다. 이 평가기는 합성 문제가 목표역의 QA 성능을 향상시키는 데 유용성을 직접적으로 평가한다.종합적인 실험을 통해 우리는 기존 기술에 비해 QVE가 선택한 종합적인 문제가 더 좋은 목표역의 QA 성능을 실현하는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 알 수 있다.그 밖에 우리는 이러한 문제와 목표역의 약 15퍼센트의 인류 주석을 사용함으로써 우리는 완전한 감독 기선과 비슷한 성능을 실현할 수 있다고 밝혔다.', 'id': 'Sintesisasi pasangan QA dengan generator pertanyaan (QG) di domain target telah menjadi pendekatan populer untuk adaptasi domain dari model menjawab pertanyaan (QA). Karena pertanyaan sintetis sering berisik dalam praktek, pekerjaan yang ada mengadaptasi skor dari model QA (atau QG) yang dilatih sebelumnya sebagai kriteria untuk memilih pertanyaan kualitas tinggi. Namun, skor ini tidak langsung melayani tujuan utama untuk meningkatkan prestasi QA pada domain target. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan ide baru untuk melatih penilai nilai pertanyaan (QVE) yang secara langsung memperkirakan kebaikan pertanyaan sintetis untuk meningkatkan prestasi QA target-domain. By conducting comprehensive experiments, we show that the synthetic questions selected by QVE can help achieve better target-domain QA performance, in comparison with existing techniques.  Kami tambahan menunjukkan bahwa dengan menggunakan pertanyaan seperti itu dan hanya sekitar 15% anotasi manusia pada domain target, kita dapat mencapai prestasi yang komparabbil dengan garis dasar yang diawasi sepenuhnya.', 'fa': 'جفت QA با ژنراتور سوال (QG) در دامنه هدف یک طریقه محبوب برای تغییر دادن دامنه از مدل جواب سوال (QA) تبدیل شده است. چون سوال\u200cهای سناتیک اغلب در تمرین صدا می\u200cشوند، کار موجود از یک مدل QA (یا QG) پیش\u200cفرض به عنوان شرایط برای انتخاب سوال\u200cهای کیفیت بالا adapt می\u200cکند. ولی این امتیاز مستقیماً هدف نهایی برای improving QA performance on the target domain را به کار نمی دهند. در این کاغذ، ما یک ایده رمانی از آموزش ارزش سوال (QVE) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که مستقیماً استفاده از سوالات سناتیک را برای improving performance QA هدف-دامنی تقریبا می\u200cکند. با انجام آزمایش\u200cهای کامل، نشان می\u200cدهیم که سوال\u200cهای سینتاتیک که توسط QVE انتخاب شده\u200cاند می\u200cتوانند کمک کنند به رسیدن عملکرد هدف\u200cدامنی QA بهتر، در مقایسه با تکنیک\u200cهای موجود. ما به اضافه نشان می دهیم که با استفاده از چنین سوالات و فقط حدود ۱۵ درصد توضیح\u200cهای انسان در دامنه هدف، می\u200cتوانیم عملکرد قابل مقایسه با خطوط پایین\u200cهای کامل تحت نظر بگیریم.', 'tr': 'Möhüm domaýynda bir sorag jeneratöri (QG) bilen QA çiftleri senetimlendirmek isleýän (QA) modelleri üçin bir domaý adaptasyon üçin popüler bir metod boldy. Sintetik soraglar praktikada köplenç sesli bolup, bar işi ýokary kalit soraglary saýlamak üçin önünlikli QA (ýa-da QG) nusgasyndan takyklaýar. Ýöne bu sanlaryň bu sanlary hakykatdanam QA netijesini hedef domaýynyň üstinmegi üçin iň soňky maksady bejermez. Bu kagyzda, biz sorag deňleýän maglumatçy (QVE) sistemasyny golaýlaşdyrmak üçin syntetik soraglaryň faydalydygyny düzenlemek üçin bir roman ideýany tanyşdyrýarys. Täpler bir deneyler edip, QVE tarapyndan saýlanan sintetik soraglaryň bolan teknikleriň derejesi ýagdaýda gowy maksady domena QA performansyny çykarmak üçin kömek edip biler. Biz de bu soruları kullanarak sadece hedef domaýyndaki 15% insan duygularynda, tamamlanmış şekilde gözetlenmiş temel hatlarla karşılaştırılabiliriz.', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha wanandoa wa QA na mtengenezaji wa maswali (QG) kwenye eneo la lengo limekuwa njia maarufu kwa ajili ya kuboresha maswali ya majibu modeli (QA). Kwa kuwa maswali ya pamoja mara nyingi huwa ni kelele katika mazoea, kazi zinazopo inabadilisha vipimo vya viwango vya QA (au QG) kama vigezo vya kuchagua maswali yenye sifa kubwa. Hata hivyo, score hizi hazitumiki moja kwa moja lengo la mwisho la kuboresha utendaji wa QA kwenye eneo la lengo. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha wazo la riwaya la kufundisha mtazamo wa thamani (QVE) ambalo moja kwa moja linakadiria matumizi ya maswali ya pamoja kwa kuboresha utendaji wa kituo cha QA. By conducting comprehensive experiments, we show that the synthetic questions selected by QVE can help achieve better target-domain QA performance, in comparison with existing techniques.  Tunaonyesha kwa kuonyesha kwamba kwa kutumia maswali kama hayo na takriban asilimia 15 ya matangazo ya binadamu kwenye eneo la lengo, tunaweza kufikia utendaji uliofanana na misingi yenye kuthibitishwa.', 'sq': 'Sintetizimi i çifteve QA me një gjenerator pyetjesh (QG) në domenin objektiv është bërë një qasje popullore për përshtatjen e domenit të modeleve për përgjigjen pyetjesh (QA). Meqenëse pyetjet sintetike janë shpesh zhurmëshme në praktikë, puna ekzistuese përshtat rezultatet nga një model QA (apo QG) i parastërvitur si kritere për të zgjedhur pyetje të cilësisë së lartë. Megjithatë, këto rezultate nuk shërbejnë drejtpërdrejt objektivin përfundimtar të përmirësimit të performancës QA në domenin objektiv. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një ide të re për trajnimin e një vlerësimi të çështjes (QVE) që vlerëson drejtpërdrejt dobinë e pyetjeve sintetike për përmirësimin e paraqitjes QA të domenit-objekt. Duke kryer eksperimente të përgjithshme, ne tregojmë se pyetjet sintetike të zgjedhura nga QVE mund të ndihmojnë në arritjen e performancës më të mirë QA objektiv-domain, në krahasim me teknikat ekzistuese. Përveç kësaj ne tregojmë se duke përdorur pyetje të tilla dhe vetëm rreth 15% e anotacioneve njerëzore në fushën objektive, ne mund të arrijmë performancë të krahasueshme me linjat bazë plotësisht mbikqyrura.', 'af': "Sintetiseer QA pare met 'n vraaggenereerder (QG) op die doel domein het 'n populêre toegang geword vir domein aanpassing van vraagte antwoord (QA) modele. Omdat sintetiese vrae dikwels geluid is in praksie, sal bestaande werk aanpasmaak poeiers van 'n pretreënde QA (of QG) model as kriterië om hoë- kwaliteit vrae te kies. Maar hierdie punte doen nie direk die ultimate doel van die verbetering van QA prestasie op die doel domein dien nie. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n nuwe idee van onderwerp van 'n vraagwaarde estimatiseer (QVE) wat direk die gebruikerheid van sintetiese vrae vurig om die doel-domein QA prestasie te verbeter. Deur komprehensiewe eksperimente te loop, wys ons dat die sintetiese vrae gekies deur QVE kan help om beter doel-domein QA prestasie te bereik, in vergelyking met bestaande teknike. Ons wys ook dat deur sodanige vrae te gebruik en net omtrent 15% van die menslike notasies op die doel domein kan ons vergelykbaar prestasie tot die volledig ondersoekte basisline bereik.", 'am': 'የQA ዓይነቶች በተጨማሪው አዲስ አዲስ ዶሜን ላይ አሰናብቷል፡፡ ሲንቲካዊ ጥያቄዎች ብዙ ጊዜ በጥያቄ ውስጥ ድምፅ ሲሆኑ፣ የአገኘው ሥራ ድምፅ የQA (ወይም የQG) ሞዴል ከፍተኛ ጥያቄን ለመምረጥ ጥያቄ እንዲያሰናከል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ ነጥቦች በአካባቢው ዶሜን ላይ የQA ፍጻሜውን ለማሻሻል ወደፊት አይገዙም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጥያቄ ዋጋውን (QVE) ለማስተማርት የአሁኑን አዲስ አሳብ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በጠቅላላ ፈተና በመፈለግ፣ QVE የተመረጠውን የሲንቲካዊ ጥያቄዎች ከመስጠት በተደረገው ጥያቄዎች ይሻላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም የምናሳየው እንደዚህ ጥያቄዎች በመጠቀም እና በአካባቢው አካባቢ 15 በመቶ የሚቆጠሩ ሰዎች ማስታወቂያውን በሙሉ በተጠበቁ መደገፊያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'টার্গেট ডোমেইনে একটি প্রশ্ন জেনারেটর (কিউজি) নিয়ে কিউ এ জোড়ার সাথে একত্রিত করা হচ্ছে প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউ এ) মডেলের প্রশ্নের উত্তরের যেহেতু সিন্টেটিক প্রশ্ন প্রায়শই প্রক্রিয়ায় আওয়াজ প্রকাশ করে, বিদ্যমান কাজের স্কোর ব্যবহার করে উচ্চমান প্রশ্ন নির্বাচনের মোডেল হ However, these scores do not directly serve the ultimate goal of improving QA performance on the target domain.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি উপলব্ধি প্রশ্নের মূল্যবোধের (কিউভি) প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণের ব্যাপারে উপস্থাপন করেছি যা সরাসরি হিসেবে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রশ্নের ক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কিউভ নির্বাচিত সিন্টেটিক প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে বিদ্যমান প্রযুক্তির তুলনায় কিউএ কার্ আমরা এছাড়াও দেখাচ্ছি যে এই প্রশ্ন ব্যবহার করে এবং লক্ষ্য ডোমেইনে মানুষের প্রায় ১৫% মানুষের বিষয়টি ব্যবহার করে, আমরা পুরোপুরি পর্যবেক্ষিত বেস', 'az': 'Hedef domenində QA çift sintezləşdirmək (QG) sual generatörü ilə sual (QA) modellərinin (domenin) uyğulaması üçün məşhur bir yol oldu. Sintetik suallar çox səslü olaraq, həmin işin yüksək kaliteli sualları seçmək üçün QA (ya da QG) modelindən müəyyən edilmiş qiymətlərini müəyyən edir. Ancaq bu nöqtələr məqsədilə QA performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq məqsədilə müəyyən edilməz. Bu kağızda, biz yeni bir fikirləri QA performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün sintetik sualların faydalanılığını təhsil edən sual qiymətini təhsil edən (QVE) təhsil etmək üçün təhsil edirik. Müxtəlif təcrübələr edərək QVE tərəfindən seçilmiş sintetik sualların daha yaxşı məqsəd-domena QA performansını tapmağa yardım edə biləcəyini göstəririk. Biz həmçinin bu sualları istifadə edərək sadəcə məqsəd domenindəki insanların 15%-ini istifadə edərək, tamamilə gözləyirləndirilmiş baz çətinlərin müqayisədə müəyyən bir performansını başa çata bilərik.', 'bs': 'Sintetizacija par QA sa generatorom pitanja (QG) na ciljnom domenu postala je popularan pristup domenu adaptacije modela odgovora na pitanja (QA). Budući da su sintetičke pitanja često bučne u praksi, postojeći rad prilagođuje rezultate iz model a pretreniranog QA (ili QG) kao kriterije za izabrati visoke kvalitetne pitanja. Međutim, ovi rezultati ne služe direktno krajnjem cilju poboljšanja učinka QA na ciljnom domenu. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novu ideju obuke procjene vrijednosti pitanja (QVE), koja izravno procjenjuje korisnost sintetičkih pitanja za poboljšanje učinka ciljnog domena QA. Vođenjem sveobuhvatnih eksperimenata pokazujemo da sintetična pitanja koju je odabrala QVE mogu pomoći ostvariti bolju izvršnost ciljne domene QA u usporedbi sa postojećim tehnikama. Dodatno pokazujemo da koristeći takva pitanja i samo oko 15% ljudskih annotacija na ciljnoj domenu možemo postići usporedbenu izvedbu sa potpuno nadziranim osnovnim linijama.', 'ca': "La sintetització de parelles QA amb un generador de preguntes (QG) en el domini destinatari s'ha convertit en un enfocament popular per l'adaptació de dominis dels models de resposta a preguntes (QA). Com que les preguntes sintètiques sovint són ruidoses en la pràctica, el treball existent adapta puntuacions d'un model QA (o QG) pré-entrenat com criteris per seleccionar preguntes d'alta qualitat. No obstant això, aquestes puntuacions no serveixen directament l'objectiu final de millorar el rendiment QA en el domini d'objectiu. En aquest paper, introduïm una nova idea de formar un estimador de valor de pregunta (QVE) que estima directament l'utilitat de preguntes sintètiques per millorar el rendiment QA del domini-alvo. Durant experiments complets, demostram que les preguntes sintètiques seleccionates per QVE poden ajudar a aconseguir millor rendiment QA en el domini-alvo, en comparació amb les tècniques existents. També demostram que utilitzant aquestes preguntes i només al voltant del 15% de les anotacions humanes en el domini d'objectiu, podem aconseguir un rendiment comparable a les línies de base plenament supervisades.", 'cs': 'Syntetizace QA párů s generátorem otázek (QG) na cílové doméně se stala populárním přístupem pro doménovou adaptaci modelů odpovědi na otázky (QA). Vzhledem k tomu, že syntetické otázky jsou v praxi často hlučné, existující práce upravuje skóre z předtrénovaného modelu QA (nebo QG) jako kritéria pro výběr vysoce kvalitních otázek. Tyto skóre však neposlouží přímo konečnému cíli zlepšení výkonu QA v cílové doméně. V tomto článku představujeme novou myšlenku tréninku odhadu hodnoty otázek (QVE), který přímo odhaduje užitečnost syntetických otázek pro zlepšení výkonu QA v cílové doméně. Provedením komplexních experimentů ukazujeme, že syntetické otázky vybrané QVE mohou pomoci dosáhnout lepšího výkonu QA v cílové doméně ve srovnání se stávajícími technikami. Dále ukazujeme, že použitím těchto otázek a pouze kolem 15% lidských anotací na cílové doméně můžeme dosáhnout srovnatelného výkonu s plně dohledovanými základními liniemi.', 'hy': 'Synthesizing QA pairs with a question generator (QG) on the target domain has become a popular approach for domain adaptation of question answering (QA) models.  Քանի որ սինթետիկ հարցերը հաճախ աղմկոտ են իրականության մեջ, գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքը հարմարեցնում է QA (կամ QG) մոդելի արդյունքները որպես բարձր որակի հարցեր ընտրելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս գնահատականները ուղղակի չեն ծառայում նպատակի վերջնական նպատակին՝ բարելավել QA արդյունքը նպատակի ոլորտում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք հարցի արժեքի գնահատողի (QV) ուսուցման նոր գաղափար, որը անմիջապես գնահատում է սինթետիկ հարցերի օգտակարությունը QA-ի նպատակային բնագավառի բարելավման համար: By conducting comprehensive experiments, we show that the synthetic questions selected by QVE can help achieve better target-domain QA performance, in comparison with existing techniques.  Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ օգտագործելով այդպիսի հարցեր և միայն նպատակային բնագավառի մարդկային annoտացիաների մոտ 15 տոկոսը, մենք կարող ենք համեմատական արդյունք հասնել ամբողջովին վերահսկվող հիմնական գծերի հետ:', 'et': 'Küsimustegeneraatoriga (QG) sünteesimine sihtdomeenis on muutunud populaarseks lähenemiseks küsimustele vastamise mudelite domeeni kohandamiseks. Kuna sünteetilised küsimused on praktikas sageli mürakad, kohandatakse olemasolevates töödes kvaliteetsete küsimuste valimiseks eelkoolitatud kvaliteedi tagamise (QG) mudeli tulemusi. Siiski ei täida need tulemused otseselt lõppeesmärki parandada kvaliteedi tagamise tulemuslikkust sihtvaldkonnas. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut ideed küsimusväärtuse estimaatori (QVE) koolitamisest, mis otseselt hindab sünteetiliste küsimuste kasulikkust sihtvaldkonna kvaliteedi tagamise tulemuslikkuse parandamisel. Põhjalike katsete läbiviimisega näitame, et QVE valitud sünteetilised küsimused aitavad saavutada paremat sihtvaldkonna kvaliteedi tagamise tulemuslikkust võrreldes olemasolevate tehnikatega. Lisaks näitame, et kasutades selliseid küsimusi ja ainult ligikaudu 15% inimese märkustest sihtvaldkonnas, saame saavutada võrreldava tulemuse täielikult järelevalve all olevate lähtejoontega.', 'fi': 'QA-parien syntetisoinnista kohdeverkkotunnuksen kysymysgeneraattorin (QG) kanssa on tullut suosittu lähestymistapa kysymysvastausmallien (QA) verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseen. Koska synteettiset kysymykset ovat usein meluisia käytännössä, olemassa olevassa työssä sovitetaan esikoulutetun laadunvarmistusmallin (QG) pisteet kriteeriksi laadukkaiden kysymysten valitsemiseksi. Nämä pisteet eivät kuitenkaan suoraan palvele lopullista tavoitetta parantaa laadunvarmistuksen suorituskykyä kohdealueella. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uuden ajatuksen kysymysarvoestimaattorin (QVE) kouluttamisesta, joka suoraan arvioi synteettisten kysymysten hyödyllisyyttä kohdealueen laadunvarmistuksen suorituskyvyn parantamisessa. Suorittamalla kattavia kokeita osoitamme, että QVE:n valitsemat synteettiset kysymykset voivat auttaa saavuttamaan paremman tavoitetason laadunvarmistuksen verrattuna olemassa oleviin tekniikoihin. Lisäksi osoitamme, että käyttämällä tällaisia kysymyksiä ja vain noin 15% kohdealueen inhimillisistä huomautuksista voimme saavuttaa vertailukelpoisen suorituskyvyn kuin täysin valvotut lähtökohdat.', 'jv': 'Sensitising XA paras with a question Generor (qG) on the goal domain has been a popular method for domain modification of question responsing (qA) modes. Dino sampeyan seneng pisan sing dibutur nggawe praksi, akeh gunakake iso nggawe Puntuan sing dumateng ning model KA (karo KG) sing diputuhke dipunangke dipunangke dipunangke sing apik dhéwé. Nanging, puntuan sing iki dadi kuwi nggawe puntuan bukane nggawe bukane nggawe barang kelas nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas token. Nang paper iki, kita mulai un barêng nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe senetik dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem sing bisa nggawe tarjamahan kelas-domain Mungkin nggawe akeh perbudhakan kompterasi akeh operasi, kita ngomong nik sesilhan seneng sanggunian winih sing gak nggawe tarjamahan kelompok-domain KA gawan sing luwih apik, karo nggayarahan karo teknik sing bisa dumadhi. Awak dhéwé nambah pirsak-nambah iki dadi iki dadi aturan luwih dumaten kanggo kowe mesthi, nik awak dhéwé iso nggawe akeh perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan liyane sing dipun-perusahaan liyane', 'sk': 'Sintetiziranje parov QA z generatorjem vprašanj (QG) na ciljni domeni je postal priljubljen pristop za domensko prilagajanje modelov odgovarjanja na vprašanja (QA). Ker so sintetična vprašanja v praksi pogosto hrupna, obstoječe delo prilagaja rezultate iz predtreniranega modela QA (ali QG) kot kriterije za izbiro visokokakovostnih vprašanj. Vendar ti rezultati ne služijo neposredno končnemu cilju izboljšanja uspešnosti zagotavljanja kakovosti na ciljni področji. V prispevku predstavljamo novo idejo usposabljanja ocenjevalca vrednosti vprašanj (QVE), ki neposredno ocenjuje uporabnost sintetičnih vprašanj za izboljšanje uspešnosti ciljnega domena QA. Z izvedbo obsežnih poskusov pokažemo, da sintetična vprašanja, ki jih izbere QVE, lahko v primerjavi z obstoječimi tehnikami pomagajo doseči boljšo učinkovitost zagotavljanja kakovosti na ciljni domeni. Dodatno dokazujemo, da lahko s takšnimi vprašanji in samo približno 15% človeških opomb na ciljni domeni dosežemo primerljivo zmogljivost s popolnoma nadzorovanimi osnovnimi linijami.', 'ha': "Idan ka haɗa nau'i biyu na QA da wani mai tambaya (QG) kan duk wuyan motsi na goani, ya kasance wata mazaɓa mai popular wa adapta ɗabi'in da za'a karɓa misali (QA). Dõmin tambayar synthetic ko da yawa za'a saurãre a cikin aikin, yana daidai score daga misalin QA (ko QG) wanda aka ƙayyade shi kamar takardar su zaɓi tambayar masu tsari da nau'i. A lokacin da, waɗannan score bã su iya amfani da shirin gabatar da QA kan tsarin da aka gabatar da shi. In this paper, we introduce a novel idea of training a question value estimator (QVE) that directly estimates the usefulness of synthetic questions for improving the target-domain QA performance.  Ga tafiyar da jarrabai masu ƙaranci, za mu nuna cewa masu tambayar synthetic da QV aka zãɓe su yana iya taimako da su isa mafiya amfani da matsayin-lokacin QA, sami da masu komai. Ina nuna yana da ɗayan su cẽwa, da za mu yi amfani da waɗancan maswali kuma taki 15% na mutane ne a kan duk aka goani, za mu iya isa cikakken aikin da aka tsare.", 'he': 'הסינטזיה של זוגות QA עם גנרטור שאלות (QG) בתחום המטרה הפכה לגישה פופולרית עבור התאמה בתחום של דוגמנים לענות על שאלות (QA). מאחר ושאלות סינטטיות לעתים קרובות רעשות בעבודה, עבודה קיימת מתאימה את נקודות מודל QA (או QG) מתאמן מראש כקריטורים לבחור שאלות איכות גבוהה. However, these scores do not directly serve the ultimate goal of improving QA performance on the target domain.  בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים רעיון חדש של אימון מערכת ערך שאלה (QVE) שמעריך ישירות את היעילות של שאלות סינתטיות לשיפור ביצועי QA בתחום המטרה. על ידי ביצוע ניסויים מורכבים, אנו מראים שהשאלות הסינטטיות שנבחרו ע"י QVE יכולות לעזור להשיג ביצוע QA מטרה-תחום טוב יותר, בהשוואה לטכניקות קיימות. בנוסף, אנו מראים כי באמצעות השימוש בשאלות כאלה ורק כ-15% מהציונים האנושיים בתחום המטרה, אנו יכולים להשיג ביצועים שווים לשווי הבסיס המפוקחים לחלוטין.', 'bo': 'Synthesizing QA pairs with a question generator (QG) on the target domain has become a popular approach for domain adaptation of question answering (QA) models. Since synthetic questions are often noisy in practice, existing work adapts scores from a pretrained QA (or QG) model as criteria to select high-quality questions. ཡིན་ནའང་། རྩིས་འབྲས་འདི་ཚོ་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་ཐད་ཀར་ཞབས་ཞུ་མེད་པ། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ཚོད་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པའི་རྐྱེན་ཐག་གཙོ་རིམ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་རྩོལ་བ་ཐག་གནང་ By conducting comprehensive experiments, we show that the synthetic questions selected by QVE can help achieve better target-domain QA performance, in comparison with existing techniques. ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་མཐོང་སྣང་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་འདུག་ལས་མིན་འདུག་པས་དམིགས'}
{'en': 'Continual Pre-training of Language Models for Math Problem Understanding with Syntax-Aware Memory Network', 'ar': 'نموذج لغوي أفضل مع توقع فئة Hypernym', 'pt': 'Melhor modelo de linguagem com previsão de classe Hypernym', 'es': 'Mejor modelo de lenguaje con predicción de clases de Hypernym', 'fr': 'Meilleur modèle de langage avec prédiction de classe Hypernym', 'zh': '有超音级类占者,善言模形', 'hi': 'Hypernym वर्ग भविष्यवाणी के साथ बेहतर भाषा मॉडल', 'ru': 'Лучшая языковая модель с предсказанием класса гипернима', 'ja': 'ハイパーニムクラス予測を備えたより良い言語モデル', 'ga': 'Múnla Teanga Níos Fearr le Tuar Ranga Hipirnim', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Καλύτερο μοντέλο γλώσσας με πρόβλεψη κλάσης υπερνύμων', 'hu': 'Jobb nyelvi modell Hypernym osztály előrejelzéssel', 'it': 'Modello linguistico migliore con la previsione della classe Hypernym', 'kk': 'Hypernym класының алдындағы жақсы тіл үлгісі', 'lt': 'Geresnis kalbos modelis su hipernimo klasės prognoze', 'mk': 'Модел на подобар јазик со предвидување на хипернимска класа', 'ms': 'Model Bahasa Lebih Baik dengan Prediksi Kelas Hypernym', 'mt': 'Better Language Model with Hypernym Class Prediction', 'ml': 'ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dനിം ക്ലാസ്സിന്റെ മുന്\u200dഗണനം', 'mn': 'Хиперним классын таамаглалттай илүү сайн хэл загвар', 'no': 'Berre språk- modell med hypernymklasseforordning', 'pl': 'Lepszy model językowy z predykcją klasy hipernimów', 'ro': 'Un model mai bun de limbă cu predicția clasei hipernice', 'sr': 'Bolji jezik model sa predviđanjem klase hipernima', 'so': 'Soonada afka ugu wanaagsan ee la xiriira fasalka Hypernym', 'sv': 'Bättre språkmodell med Hypernym klass förutsägelse', 'ta': 'Hypernym வகுப்பு விருப்பங்களுடன் மொழி மாதிரி', 'si': 'HypernymName', 'ur': 'ہیپر نیم کلاس کے ساتھ بہتر زبان مدل', 'vi': 'Mô hình ngôn ngữ tốt hơn với yếu tố Hypernym', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Beter Taalmodel met Hyperniem Class Prediction', 'da': 'Bedre sprogmodel med Hypernym klasse forudsigelse', 'bg': 'По-добър езиков модел с прогноза за клас хиперним', 'hr': 'Bolji jezički model s predviđanjem klase hipernima', 'de': 'Besseres Sprachmodell mit Hypernym-Klassenvorhersage', 'id': 'Model Bahasa Lebih Baik dengan Prediksi Kelas Hypernym', 'fa': 'مدل زبان بهتر با پیشنهاد کلاس هاپر نیم', 'sw': 'Better Language Model with Hypernym Class Prediction', 'tr': 'Hipernim Täsiri bilen gowy dil nusgasy', 'af': 'Beter Taal Model met Hypernym Klas voorvloediging', 'sq': 'Model gjuhësh më të mirë me parashikimin e klasës hipernim', 'ko': '더 좋은 언어 모델, Hypernym 유형 예측', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Better Language Model with Hypernym Class Prediction', 'az': 'Hypernim SńĪnńĪf √Ėn-n…ôsih…ôti il…ô daha yaxŇüńĪ Dil Modeli', 'bn': 'হাইপার্নিম ক্লাসের সাথে ভাষা মডেল', 'bs': 'Bolji jezik model sa predviđanjem klase hipernima', 'ca': 'Model de llenguatge millor amb predicció de classe hipernima', 'cs': 'Lepší jazykový model s predikcí třídy hypernymů', 'et': 'Parem keelemudel hüpernüümi klassi prognoosiga', 'fi': 'Parempi kielimalli Hypernym Class Ennuste', 'sk': 'Boljši jezikovni model z napovedjo razreda hipernim', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'מודל שפה טובה יותר עם ציון שיעור היפרנים', 'bo': 'Hypernym ལྡེབ་གྱི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་དང་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we study how to continually pre-train language models for improving the understanding of math problems. Specifically, we focus on solving a fundamental challenge in modeling math problems, how to fuse the semantics of textual description and formulas, which are highly different in essence. To address this issue, we propose a new approach called COMUS to continually pre-train language models for math problem understanding with syntax-aware memory network. In this approach, we first construct the math syntax graph to model the structural semantic information, by combining the parsing trees of the text and formulas, and then design the syntax-aware memory networks to deeply fuse the features from the graph and text. With the help of syntax relations, we can model the interaction between the token from the text and its semantic-related nodes within the formulas, which is helpful to capture fine-grained semantic correlations between texts and formulas. Besides, we devise three continual pre-training tasks to further align and fuse the representations of the text and math syntax graph. Experimental results on four tasks in the math domain demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach. Our code and data are publicly available at the link: bluehttps://github.com/RUCAIBox/COMUS.', 'pt': 'Os modelos de linguagem baseados em classe (LMs) foram criados há muito tempo para abordar a esparsidade de contexto em LMs $n$-gram.\nNeste estudo, revisitamos essa abordagem no contexto de LMs neurais.\nNossa hipótese é que a previsão baseada em classe leva a uma agregação de contexto implícita para palavras semelhantes e, portanto, pode melhorar a generalização para palavras raras.\nMapeamos palavras que têm um hiperônimo WordNet comum para a mesma classe e treinamos grandes LMs neurais por meio do recozimento gradual da previsão da classe para a previsão de token durante o treinamento.\nEmpiricamente, essa estratégia de aprendizado curricular melhora consistentemente a perplexidade em relação a vários modelos baseados em Transformer grandes e de alto desempenho em dois conjuntos de dados, WikiText-103 e ARXIV.\nNossa análise mostra que a melhoria de desempenho é alcançada sem sacrificar o desempenho em palavras raras.\nFinalmente, documentamos outras tentativas que falharam em produzir ganhos empíricos e discutimos direções futuras para a adoção de LMs baseados em classes em maior escala.', 'es': 'Los modelos de lenguaje (LM) basados en clases se han diseñado durante mucho tiempo para abordar la escasez de contexto en los LM de $n$-gram. \nEn este estudio, revisamos este enfoque en el contexto de los LM neuronales. \nPresumimos que la predicción basada en clases conduce a una agregación de contexto implícita para palabras similares y, por lo tanto, puede mejorar la generalización de palabras poco comunes. \nMapeamos palabras que tienen un hiperónimo común de WordNet a la misma clase y entrenamos LM neuronales grandes mediante el recocido gradual de la predicción de la clase a la predicción de tokens durante el entrenamiento. \nEmpíricamente, esta estrategia de aprendizaje curricular mejora constantemente la perplejidad sobre varios modelos grandes y de alto rendimiento basados en Transformer de última generación en dos conjuntos de datos, WikiText-103 y ARXIV. \nNuestro análisis muestra que la mejora del rendimiento se logra sin sacrificar el rendimiento en palabras raras. \nFinalmente, documentamos otros intentos que no lograron obtener beneficios empíricos y discutimos las direcciones futuras para la adopción de LM basados en clases a mayor escala.', 'ar': 'لطالما تم تصميم نماذج اللغة المستندة إلى الفصل (LMs) لمعالجة تباين السياق في $ n $ -gram LMs.\nفي هذه الدراسة ، نعيد النظر في هذا النهج في سياق LMs العصبية.\nنحن نفترض أن التنبؤ المستند إلى الفصل يؤدي إلى تجميع سياق ضمني للكلمات المتشابهة وبالتالي يمكنه تحسين التعميم للكلمات النادرة.\nنقوم بتعيين الكلمات التي تحتوي على كلمة WordNet تشعبية مشتركة إلى نفس الفئة وتدريب LMs العصبية الكبيرة عن طريق التلدين تدريجيًا من التنبؤ بالفصل إلى تنبؤ رمزي أثناء التدريب.\nمن الناحية التجريبية ، تعمل إستراتيجية تعلم المناهج الدراسية هذه باستمرار على تحسين الارتباك حول العديد من النماذج الكبيرة عالية الأداء القائمة على المحولات على مجموعتي بيانات ، WikiText-103 و ARXIV.\nيوضح تحليلنا أن تحسين الأداء يتحقق دون التضحية بالأداء على الكلمات النادرة.\nأخيرًا ، قمنا بتوثيق المحاولات الأخرى التي فشلت في تحقيق مكاسب تجريبية ، ومناقشة الاتجاهات المستقبلية لاعتماد LMs المستندة إلى الطبقة على نطاق أوسع.', 'fr': "Les modèles de langage basés sur les classes (LM) ont été conçus depuis longtemps pour remédier à la rareté du contexte dans les LM $n$-gram. \nDans cette étude, nous revoyons cette approche dans le contexte des LM neuronaux. \nNous émettons l'hypothèse que la prédiction basée sur les classes conduit à une agrégation contextuelle implicite pour des mots similaires et peut ainsi améliorer la généralisation pour les mots rares. \nNous mappons les mots qui ont un hyperonyme WordNet commun à la même classe et entraînons de grands LM neuronaux en remontant progressivement de la prédiction de la classe à la prédiction symbolique pendant l'entraînement. \nDe manière empirique, cette stratégie d'apprentissage améliore constamment la perplexité par rapport à divers modèles de pointe basés sur Transformer de grande taille et hautement performants sur deux ensembles de données, WikiText-103 et ARXIV. \nNotre analyse montre que l'amélioration des performances est obtenue sans sacrifier les performances sur des mots rares. \nEnfin, nous documentons d'autres tentatives qui n'ont pas abouti à des gains empiriques, et nous discutons des orientations futures pour l'adoption de LMS basés sur les classes à plus grande échelle.", 'hi': 'वर्ग-आधारित भाषा मॉडल (एलएम) लंबे समय से $n $ ग्राम एलएम में संदर्भ स्पर्सिटी को संबोधित करने के लिए तैयार किए गए हैं। \nइस अध्ययन में, हम तंत्रिका एलएम के संदर्भ में इस दृष्टिकोण को फिर से देखते हैं। \nहम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि वर्ग-आधारित भविष्यवाणी समान शब्दों के लिए एक अंतर्निहित संदर्भ एकत्रीकरण की ओर ले जाती है और इस प्रकार दुर्लभ शब्दों के लिए सामान्यीकरण में सुधार कर सकती है। \nहम उन शब्दों को मैप करते हैं जिनके पास एक ही कक्षा के लिए एक आम वर्डनेट हाइपरनिम है और प्रशिक्षण के दौरान टोकन भविष्यवाणी के लिए कक्षा की भविष्यवाणी करने से धीरे-धीरे एनीलिंग करके बड़े तंत्रिका एलएम को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। \nअनुभवजन्य रूप से, यह पाठ्यक्रम सीखने की रणनीति लगातार दो डेटासेट, WikiText-103 और ARXIV पर विभिन्न बड़े, अत्यधिक-निष्पादित अत्याधुनिक ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल पर उलझन में सुधार करती है। \nहमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि प्रदर्शन में सुधार दुर्लभ शब्दों पर प्रदर्शन का त्याग किए बिना प्राप्त किया जाता है। \nअंत में, हम अन्य प्रयासों को दस्तावेज करते हैं जो अनुभवजन्य लाभ प्राप्त करने में विफल रहे, और बड़े पैमाने पर वर्ग-आधारित एलएम को अपनाने के लिए भविष्य के निर्देशों पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ja': 'クラスベース言語モデル（ LM ）は、$ n $- gram LMのコンテキストの乏しさに対処するために長い間考案されてきた。 \nこの研究では、神経LMの文脈でこのアプローチを再検討します。 \nクラスベースの予測は、類似する単語の暗黙の文脈集約につながり、したがって、希少な単語の一般化を改善できると仮定します。 \n共通のWordNetハイパーニムを持つ単語を同じクラスにマッピングし、トレーニング中にクラス予測からトークン予測に徐々にアニーリングすることで、大きなニューラルLMをトレーニングします。 \n経験的に、このカリキュラム学習戦略は、WikiText -103とARXIVという2つのデータセット上のさまざまな大規模で高性能な最先端のトランスフォーマーベースモデルにわたって一貫して困惑を改善する。 \n私たちの分析によると、パフォーマンスの向上は、希少な単語のパフォーマンスを犠牲にすることなく達成されます。 \n最後に、経験的な成果をもたらすことができなかった他の試みを文書化し、クラスベースのLMをより大きな規模で採用するための将来の方向性について議論します。', 'zh': '盖类语模样(LM)久被设计,以决$n$-gram LM中上下文疏性。 \n于此论之,神经RM背景下更审此法也。 \n设以类会类单词之隐式上下文,可以改罕见单词之泛化。 \n吾将有通用 WordNet 超元名之单词映于同类,而从其占类到表识渐退火以习大神经 LM。 \n以此言之,此程学习策略于两数集WikiText-103、ARXIV上频改诸大形,高性能最先进之Transformer惑。 \n吾之分析表明,不牺牲罕见单词性能者,性也。 \n最后,我们录了他未生经验收益的尝试,并讨论了在更大限内用基于类LM的来方。', 'ru': 'Языковые модели на основе классов (LM) уже давно разработаны для решения проблемы разрозненности контекста в $ n$ -граммах LM. \nВ этом исследовании мы возвращаемся к этому подходу в контексте нейронных LM. \nМы предполагаем, что классовое прогнозирование приводит к неявной агрегации контекста для похожих слов и, таким образом, может улучшить обобщение для редких слов. \nМы сопоставляем слова, имеющие общий гиперним WordNet, с одним классом и обучаем большие нейронные LM, постепенно отжигая от предсказания класса до предсказания токена во время обучения. \nЭмпирически, эта стратегия обучения по учебной программе последовательно улучшает недоумение по сравнению с различными большими, высокоэффективными современными моделями на основе трансформаторов на двух наборах данных, WikiText-103 и ARXIV. \nНаш анализ показывает, что улучшение производительности достигается без ущерба для производительности на редких словах. \nНаконец, мы документируем другие попытки, которые не принесли эмпирических выгод, и обсуждаем будущие направления для принятия основанных на классах ЖМ в более широком масштабе.', 'ga': 'Ceapadh samhlacha teanga rang-bhunaithe (LManna) le fada chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar thearcúlacht comhthéacs i $n$-gram LM.\nSa staidéar seo, déanaimid athchuairt ar an gcur chuige seo i gcomhthéacs LManna néaracha.\nTugaimid hipitéis go mbíonn comhiomlánú intuigthe comhthéacs d’fhocail chomhchosúla mar thoradh ar thuar rangbhunaithe agus mar sin gur féidir leis ginearálú d’fhocail neamhchoitianta a fheabhsú.\nDéanaimid focail a bhfuil hypernym WordNet coitianta acu a mhapáil don rang céanna agus cuirimid oiliúint ar LManna móra néaracha trí anáil a dhéanamh de réir a chéile ón rang a thuar go dtí tuar comharthaí le linn na hoiliúna.\nGo heimpíreach, cuireann an straitéis foghlama curaclaim seo feabhas go seasta ar anróphléastacht thar mhúnlaí éagsúla ard-fheidhmíochta Trasfhoirmeoirí, atá bunaithe ar an gcaighdeán is airde, ar dhá thacar sonraí, WikiText-103 agus ARXIV.\nLéiríonn ár n-anailís go mbaintear an feabhsú feidhmíochta amach gan feidhmíocht a íobairt ar fhocail neamhchoitianta.\nMar fhocal scoir, déanaimid doiciméadú ar iarrachtaí eile nár éirigh leo gnóthachain eimpíreacha a bhaint amach, agus pléimid na treoracha amach anseo chun LManna rangbhunaithe a ghlacadh ar scála níos mó.', 'el': 'Τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα βασισμένα σε κατηγορίες έχουν σχεδιαστεί εδώ και καιρό για να αντιμετωπίσουν την έλλειψη περιβάλλοντος σε $n$-γραμμάριο LM.', 'ka': 'კლასის დაბათებული ენის მოდელები (LMs) ძალიან განსაზღვრებულია, რომ კონტექსტური სისტემის შესახებ $n$- გრამის LMs.', 'it': 'I modelli di linguaggio basati sulle classi (LM) sono stati a lungo ideati per affrontare la scarsità di contesto nei LM $n$-gram.', 'lt': 'Klasais pagrįsti kalbų modeliai (LM) buvo sukurti ilgai, kad būtų atsižvelgta į konteksto mažumą n$-gramais LM.', 'kk': 'Класс негіздеген тіл үлгілері (LMs) $n$- грамм LMs дегенде контекстік жақсартылығын адрес үшін ұзын құрылған.', 'mk': 'Моделите на јазик базирани на класата (LMs) се подготвени долго време за решавање на контекстната скратност во LMs $n$-грам.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa berdasarkan kelas (LMs) telah direka lama untuk mengatasi kecepatan konteks dalam LMs $n$-gram.', 'hu': 'Az osztályalapú nyelvi modelleket (LM-ket) régóta kidolgozták, hogy kezeljék a kontextus ritkását a $n$-grammos LM-ekben.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli lingwistiċi bbażati fuq il-klassi (LMs) ilhom jitfasslu għal żmien twil biex jindirizzaw l-iskarsezza tal-kuntest f’LMs ta’ $n$-gramma.', 'ml': 'ക്ലാസ്സ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d (LMs) നീണ്ടേയുള്ള സംസ്കാരത്തിന്റെ സ്പെസിറ്റി വിവരിക്കാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിച്', 'mn': 'Классын үндсэн хэл загварууд (LMs) нь доллар n$-грамм LMs-ээс харьцуулахын тулд урт хугацаанд төлөвлөгдсөн.', 'pl': 'Modele językowe oparte na klasach (LMs) od dawna zostały opracowane, aby zająć się niewielką ilością kontekstu w $n$-gram LMs.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice bazate pe clasă (LM) au fost mult timp concepute pentru a aborda lipsa contextului în LM $n$-gram.', 'no': 'Klassebaserte språk- modeller (LMs) er lang devisert for å adressa kontekstsparsiteten i $n$- gram LMs.', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha luuqada fasalka (LMs) waxaa waqti dheer loo qorshay in lagu sheekeysto qoraalka kooxaha ah oo lagu qorayo $-gram LMs.', 'sv': 'Klassbaserade språkmodeller (LM) har länge utformats för att hantera kontextspartitet i $n$-gram LM.', 'si': 'ක්ලාස් අධාරිත භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් (LMs) ලොකු වෙලාවක් තියෙනවා $n$- ග්\u200dරාම් LMs වල සංවේදනය සඳහා සංවේදනය ස', 'ta': 'வகுப்பு அடிப்படையிலான மொழி மாதிரிகள் (LMs) நீண்ட நேரம் திட்டமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது $n$- gram LMs.', 'ur': 'کلاس کی بنیادی زبان نمڈل (LMs) کو ڈالن$-گرم LMs میں کنٹنسیٹ سپرسیٹی کے بارے میں بہت زیادہ طراحی کی گئی ہے', 'sr': 'Modeli jezika baziranih na klasi (LMs) dugo su napravljeni za rješavanje kontekstske sparsitnosti u LMs $ n$-gram.', 'vi': 'Các mô hình ngôn ngữ dựa vào lớp học (LMs) đã được thiết kế lâu để giải quyết mớ khung lề của tập thể.', 'uz': 'Class-based language models (LMs) have been long devised to address context sparsity in $n$-gram LMs.', 'nl': 'Class-based language models (LMs) zijn al lang ontwikkeld om contextschaarste in $n$-gram LMs aan te pakken.', 'bg': 'Класовите езикови модели (ЛМ) отдавна са разработени, за да се справят с рядкостта на контекста в ЛМ $n$-грам.', 'hr': 'Modeli jezika baziranih na klasi (LMs) dugo su napravljeni za rješavanje kontekstske rezervnosti u LMs $ n$-gram.', 'id': 'Model bahasa berdasarkan kelas (LMs) telah lama direncanakan untuk mengatasi kecepatan konteks dalam LMs $n$-gram.', 'de': 'Klassenbasierte Sprachmodelle (LMs) wurden seit langem entwickelt, um Kontextsparsität in $n$-Gramm LMs zu adressieren.', 'ko': '오랫동안 클래스 기반 언어 모델 (LMs) 은 $n$-gram LMs의 상하문 희소 문제를 해결하기 위해 설계되어 왔다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زبانی (LMs) بر پایه کلاس (LMs) مدت طولانی برای آزمایش محدوده\u200cی محدوده\u200cای در LMs $ n$ گرم طراحی شده\u200cاند.', 'sw': 'Class-based language models (LMs) have been long devised to address context sparsity in $n$-gram LMs.', 'tr': 'Tägler tabanly dil nusgalary', 'da': "Klassebaserede sprogmodeller (LM'er) er længe blevet udviklet til at adressere kontekst sparsommelighed i $n$-gram LM'er.", 'hy': 'Դասի հիմնված լեզվի մոդելները երկար ժամանակ ստեղծվել են, որպեսզի հաղթահարեն կոնտեքստի հազվադեպությունը $n$-գրամ LM-ում:', 'af': 'Klasse-gebaseerde taal modele (LMs) is lank gedefinieerd om konteks sparsiteit in $n$-gram LMs te adres.', 'az': 'S캼n 캼f-tabanl캼 dil modell톛ri (LMs)', 'sq': 'Modelet e gjuhës me bazë n ë klasë (LMs) janë krijuar për një kohë të gjatë për të trajtuar pakësinë e kontekstit në $n$-gram LMs.', 'bs': 'Modeli jezika baziranih na klasi (LMs) dugo su napravljeni za rješavanje kontekstske sparsitnosti u LMs $ n$-gram.', 'am': 'የደረጃ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች (LMs) በ$n-gram LMs.', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatge basats en classes han estat dissenyats fa molt de temps per abordar l'escassetat de contextes en LMs de $n$-gram.", 'cs': 'Jazykové modely založené na třídě (LM) byly dlouho navrženy pro řešení kontextové řídkosti v $n$-gram LM.', 'et': 'Klassipõhised keelemudelid (LMs) on pikka aega välja töötatud, et käsitleda konteksti hõredust $n$-grammi LMs.', 'fi': 'Luokkapohjaiset kielimallit (LM) on jo pitkään suunniteltu käsittelemään kontekstin niukkuutta $n$-gramman LM:issä.', 'bn': 'ক্লাস ভিত্তিক ভাষার মডেল (এলএমএস) দীর্ঘদিন পরিকল্পনা করা হয়েছে এনএনএমএস ডলার $-গ্রাম এলএমএলএমএস-এ প্রতিষ্ঠানে', 'sk': 'Modeli jezikov, ki temeljijo na razredu (LM), so bili dolgo oblikovani za obravnavanje redkosti konteksta v LM $ n$-gram.', 'ha': 'An ƙayyade misãlai na harshen mai fasa (LM) don a yi amfani da muhalli na mazaɓa cikin $n$-gram LM.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפת מבוססים בכיתה (LMs) כבר הרבה זמן מתכננים כדי להתמודד עם הידרות הקשר ב $ n$-gram LMs.', 'jv': 'Name', 'bo': 'གྲྭར་བརྟེན་ནས་སྐད་རིགས་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས(LMs)འདི་$n$-gram LMs ནང'}
{'en': 'Pre-training and Fine-tuning Neural Topic Model: A Simple yet Effective Approach to Incorporating External Knowledge', 'ar': 'معالجة اكتشاف الأخبار الزائفة من خلال التحسين المستمر لتمثيل السياق الاجتماعي باستخدام الشبكات العصبية للرسم البياني', 'fr': "Lutter contre la détection des fausses informations en améliorant continuellement les représentations du contexte social à l'aide des réseaux de", 'es': 'Abordar la detección de noticias falsas mejorando continuamente las representaciones del contexto social mediante redes neuronales gráficas', 'pt': 'Combatendo a detecção de notícias falsas melhorando continuamente as representações do contexto social usando redes neurais gráficas', 'ja': 'グラフニューラルネットワークを使用したソーシャルコンテキスト表現の継続的な改善によるフェイクニュース検出への取り組み', 'ru': 'Решение проблемы обнаружения фейковых новостей путем постоянного улучшения представлений социального контекста с помощью нейронных сетей Graph', 'zh': '用图神经网络不断改进世上下文示假新闻检也', 'hi': 'ग्राफ न्यूरल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके सामाजिक संदर्भ अभ्यावेदन में लगातार सुधार करके नकली समाचार का पता लगाना से निपटना', 'ga': 'Dul i nGleic le Brath Nuachta Bréige trí Léiriúcháin Comhthéacs Sóisialta a Fheabhsú go Leanúnach ag úsáid Líonraí Néaracha Grafa', 'ka': 'სოციალური კონტექსტური გამოყენებაზე საქმე გახსნა შეცდომა განახსნა', 'el': 'Αντιμετώπιση της ανίχνευσης ψεύτικων ειδήσεων με τη συνεχή βελτίωση των αναπαραστάσεων κοινωνικού πλαισίου χρησιμοποιώντας γραφήματα Νευρικά Δίκτυα', 'hu': 'A hamis hírek felismerésének kezelése a társadalmi kontextusképviseletek folyamatos javításával grafikus neurális hálózatok használatával', 'it': 'Affrontare il rilevamento di notizie false migliorando continuamente le rappresentazioni del contesto sociale utilizzando le reti neurali grafiche', 'kk': 'Графикалық нейралық желілерді қолдану арқылы жалғыз жаңалықтарды табу', 'lt': 'Spręsti klaidingų naujienų nustatymą nuolat gerinant socialinio konteksto atstovavimą naudojant grafinius nervinius tinklus', 'mk': 'Да се справи со детекцијата на лажни вести со континуирано подобрување на социјалните контекстни претставувања со користење на графички неурални мрежи', 'ms': 'Menatap pengesan berita palsu dengan memperbaiki Persembahan Konteks Sosial secara terus menerus menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Graf', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സാമൂഹ്യ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ത', 'mt': 'Tackling Fake News Detection by Continually Improving Social Context Representations using Graph Neural Networks', 'mn': 'График сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг ашигласнаар нийгмийн сорилтуудыг улам сайжруулах', 'no': 'Oppdaging av falske nyhetar ved å kontinuerleg forbetra sosial kontekst- representasjonar ved hjelp av grafen neuronettverk', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Qiimeynta macluumaadka dhaqdhaqaalaha ee xafiiska dhaqdhaqaaqa ah ee ku sii beddelaya wadanka bulshada ee isticmaalka shabakadda Naural', 'sv': 'Bekämpa detektering av falska nyheter genom att kontinuerligt förbättra representationer av sociala sammanhang med hjälp av grafneurala nätverk', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje lažnih vijesti sa neprestano poboljšavanjem predstavljanja socijalnog konteksta koristeći nervne mreže grafika', 'pl': 'Walka z wykrywaniem fałszywych wiadomości poprzez ciągłe ulepszanie reprezentacji kontekstu społecznego za pomocą wykresów sieci neuronowych', 'ro': 'Combaterea detectării false a știrilor prin îmbunătățirea continuă a reprezentărilor contextului social utilizând rețelele neutre grafice', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'گراف نیورال نیٹورک کے استعمال سے سیاسی کنٹکسٹ ریسپینسٹ کے استعمال سے ٹاکلینگ فاک نیویورک کا اظہار', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Xử lý tin giả Phát hiện bằng cách cải thiện liên tục môi trường xã hội bằng mạng thần kinh đồ hoạ', 'bg': 'Справяне с откриването на фалшиви новини чрез непрекъснато подобряване на представянето на социалния контекст с помощта на графични неврални мрежи', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje lažnih vijesti pored kontinualnog poboljšanja predstavljanja socijalnog konteksta koristeći nervne mreže grafika', 'da': 'Bekæmpelse af falske nyheder ved løbende at forbedre sociale sammenhængsrepræsentationer ved hjælp af graferneutrale netværk', 'nl': 'Het aanpakken van nepnieuws detectie door continue verbetering van sociale contextrepresentaties met behulp van grafiekneurale netwerken', 'id': 'Menyelesaikan Deteksi Berita Salah Dengan terus meningkatkan Persembahan Konteks Sosial menggunakan Graph Neural Networks', 'de': 'Bekämpfung der Erkennung von Fake News durch kontinuierliche Verbesserung der Darstellung sozialer Kontexte mithilfe von Graph-Neuronalen Netzwerken', 'ko': '도형 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 사회 배경 표시를 끊임없이 개선함으로써 가짜 뉴스 검측을 처리하다', 'fa': 'بازرسی اخبار فاعلی با استفاده از شبکه های عصبی Graph', 'sw': 'Kugundua Habari za Udanganyiko na kuendelea kuboresha Mazungumzo ya Kijamii kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Neural', 'sq': 'Duke trajtuar zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme duke përmirësuar vazhdimisht përfaqësimet e kontekstit social duke përdorur rrjetet nervore grafike', 'af': 'Laaiïng van falske nuusbeskrywing deur voortdurende verbetering van sosiale konteks voorstellings met gebruik van Grafiek Neurale Netwerke', 'tr': 'Tackling Fake Haýry Detection by Continuously Improving Social Context Representations using Graph Neural Networks', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ግንኙነት አቀማመጥ በመጠቀም ላይ የፊደል ነውራር መረብ በመጠቀም የተጠቃሚ ውይይት', 'hy': 'Գործել կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերումը շարունակաբար բարելավելով սոցիալական կոնտեքստի ներկայացումները Graf Նյարդային ցանցերով', 'az': 'Grafik Nöral Ağlarını istifadə edərək Sosyal Kontekst Göstüsünü Daxil Əlavə Etən Fake Haqqalar Görünüş', 'bn': 'গ্রাফ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে সামাজিক যোগাযোগ বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধি প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে ট্যাকিং ফ্যাক স', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje lažnih vijesti pored kontinualnog poboljšanja predstavljanja socijalnog konteksta koristeći nervne mreže grafika', 'cs': 'Řešení detekce falešných zpráv pomocí neustálého zlepšování reprezentace sociálního kontextu pomocí grafových neuronových sítí', 'et': 'Võltsitud uudiste tuvastamise vastu võitlemine sotsiaalse konteksti esinduste pideva parandamise abil graafiliste neuraalsete võrkude abil', 'fi': 'Väärennettyjen uutisten havaitseminen parantamalla jatkuvasti sosiaalisen kontekstin edustusta graafisten hermoverkkojen avulla', 'ca': 'Remanar la detecció de notícies falses millorant continuament les representacions del contexte social utilitzant xarxes neurals gràfics', 'jv': 'Tacking Fake Info detection by continue', 'sk': 'Reševanje odkrivanja lažnih novic s stalnim izboljšanjem predstavitev socialnega konteksta z uporabo grafičnih nevralnih omrežij', 'he': 'להתמודד עם גילוי חדשות מזויפות על ידי שיפור ממשיך מייצגים של קשר חברתי באמצעות רשתות נוירוליות גראפ', 'bo': 'Tackling Fake News Detection by Continuously Improving Social Context Representations using Graph Neural Networks', 'ha': 'Tackling Fake News Detection by Continually Improving Social Context Representations using Graph Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'Recent years have witnessed growing interests in incorporating external knowledge such as pre-trained word embeddings (PWEs) or pre-trained language models (PLMs) into neural topic modeling. However, we found that employing PWEs and PLMs for topic modeling only achieved limited performance improvements but with huge computational overhead. In this paper, we propose a novel strategy to incorporate external knowledge into neural topic modeling where the neural topic model is pre-trained on a large corpus and then fine-tuned on the target dataset. Experiments have been conducted on three datasets and results show that the proposed approach significantly outperforms both current state-of-the-art neural topic models and some topic modeling approaches enhanced with PWEs or PLMs. Moreover, further study shows that the proposed approach greatly reduces the need for the huge size of training data.', 'ar': 'سهولة الوصول ، وتنوع المحتوى ، والتفاعلات الواسعة الانتشار هي بعض الأسباب التي تجعل وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي تزداد شعبية. ومع ذلك ، فقد مكّن هذا الارتفاع أيضًا من انتشار الأخبار الكاذبة والنصوص التي تنشرها مصادر الأخبار بقصد نشر معلومات مضللة والتأثير على المعتقدات. يعد اكتشافها مشكلة مهمة وصعبة لمنع المعلومات الخاطئة على نطاق واسع والحفاظ على مجتمع صحي.\n\nنحن ننظر إلى اكتشاف الأخبار المزيفة على أنه تفكير في العلاقات بين المصادر والمقالات التي تنشرها وإشراك المستخدمين على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي في إطار رسم بياني. بعد تضمين هذه المعلومات ، نقوم بصياغة عوامل الاستدلال التي تزيد من حواف الرسم البياني من خلال الكشف عن التفاعلات غير المرصودة بين عناصرها ، مثل التشابه بين محتويات المستندات وأنماط تفاعل المستخدمين. تُظهر تجاربنا على مهمتين صعبتين لاكتشاف الأخبار المزيفة أن استخدام مشغلي الاستدلال يؤدي إلى فهم أفضل لإطار عمل الوسائط الاجتماعية مما يتيح انتشار الأخبار المزيفة ، مما يؤدي إلى تحسين الأداء.', 'fr': "La facilité d'accès, la variété des contenus et les interactions rapides et généralisées sont quelques-unes des raisons qui rendent les médias sociaux de plus en plus populaires. Cependant, cette hausse a également permis la propagation de fausses nouvelles, des textes publiés par des sources d'information dans l'intention de répandre de la désinformation et d'influencer les croyances. Le détecter est un problème important et difficile pour prévenir la désinformation à grande échelle et maintenir une société saine. \n\nNous considérons la détection des fausses nouvelles comme un raisonnement sur les relations entre les sources, les articles qu'elles publient et l'engagement des utilisateurs sur les réseaux sociaux dans un cadre graphique. Après avoir intégré ces informations, nous formulons des opérateurs d'inférence qui augmentent les contours du graphique en révélant les interactions non observées entre ses éléments, telles que la similitude entre le contenu des documents et les modèles d'engagement des utilisateurs. Nos expériences sur deux tâches complexes de détection de fausses nouvelles montrent que l'utilisation d'opérateurs d'inférence permet de mieux comprendre le cadre des médias sociaux qui permet la diffusion de fausses informations, ce qui se traduit par une amélioration des performances.", 'pt': 'Acesso fácil, variedade de conteúdo e interações rápidas e generalizadas são alguns dos motivos que tornam as mídias sociais cada vez mais populares. No entanto, esse aumento também possibilitou a propagação de fake news, texto publicado por fontes de notícias com a intenção de disseminar desinformação e influenciar crenças. Detectá-lo é um problema importante e desafiador para evitar a desinformação em larga escala e manter uma sociedade saudável.\n\nVemos a detecção de notícias falsas como um raciocínio sobre as relações entre as fontes, os artigos que publicam e o envolvimento dos usuários nas mídias sociais em uma estrutura de gráficos. Após incorporar essas informações, formulamos operadores de inferência que aumentam as bordas do gráfico ao revelar interações não observadas entre seus elementos, como similaridade entre o conteúdo dos documentos e os padrões de engajamento dos usuários. Nossos experimentos em duas tarefas desafiadoras de detecção de notícias falsas mostram que o uso de operadores de inferência leva a uma melhor compreensão da estrutura de mídia social, permitindo a disseminação de notícias falsas, resultando em melhor desempenho.', 'es': 'El fácil acceso, la variedad de contenido y las interacciones rápidas y generalizadas son algunas de las razones por las que las redes sociales son cada vez más populares. Sin embargo, este aumento también ha permitido la propagación de noticias falsas, textos publicados por fuentes de noticias con la intención de difundir información errónea e influir en las creencias. Detectarlo es un problema importante y desafiante para evitar la desinformación a gran escala y mantener una sociedad sana. \n\nConsideramos que la detección de noticias falsas es un razonamiento sobre las relaciones entre las fuentes, los artículos que publican y la participación de los usuarios en las redes sociales en un marco de gráficos. Después de incorporar esta información, formulamos operadores de inferencia que aumentan los bordes del gráfico al revelar interacciones no observadas entre sus elementos, como la similitud entre el contenido de los documentos y los patrones de participación de los usuarios. Nuestros experimentos sobre dos desafiantes tareas de detección de noticias falsas muestran que el uso de operadores de inferencia conduce a una mejor comprensión del marco de las redes sociales que permiten la difusión de noticias falsas, lo que mejora el rendimiento.', 'hi': 'आसान पहुंच, सामग्री की विविधता, और तेजी से व्यापक बातचीत सोशल मीडिया को तेजी से लोकप्रिय बनाने के कुछ कारण हैं। हालांकि, इस वृद्धि ने गलत सूचना फैलाने और विश्वासों को प्रभावित करने के इरादे से समाचार स्रोतों द्वारा प्रकाशित नकली समाचारों, पाठ के प्रचार को भी सक्षम किया है। इसका पता लगाना बड़े पैमाने पर गलत सूचनाओं को रोकने और स्वस्थ समाज को बनाए रखने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण और चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या है। \n\nहम नकली समाचार का पता लगाने को स्रोतों, लेखों के बीच संबंधों पर तर्क के रूप में देखते हैं, जो वे प्रकाशित करते हैं, और ग्राफ फ्रेमवर्क में सोशल मीडिया पर उपयोगकर्ताओं को संलग्न करते हैं। इस जानकारी को एम्बेड करने के बाद, हम अनुमान ऑपरेटर तैयार करते हैं जो इसके तत्वों के बीच अनपेक्षित इंटरैक्शन का खुलासा करके ग्राफ किनारों को बढ़ाते हैं, जैसे कि दस्तावेजों की सामग्री और उपयोगकर्ताओं के सगाई पैटर्न के बीच समानता। दो चुनौतीपूर्ण नकली समाचार का पता लगाने वाले कार्यों पर हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि अनुमान ऑपरेटरों का उपयोग करने से सोशल मीडिया ढांचे की बेहतर समझ होती है जो नकली समाचार प्रसार को सक्षम करती है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप प्रदर्शन में सुधार होता है।', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアがますます人気になる理由のいくつかは、簡単にアクセスできること、さまざまなコンテンツ、そして迅速に広がるインタラクションです。 しかし、この上昇はまた、誤った情報を拡散し、信念を揺るがすことを意図して、ニュースソースによって出版されたフェイクニュース、テキストの伝播を可能にしました。 それを検出することは、大規模な誤った情報を防止し、健全な社会を維持するために重要で挑戦的な問題です。 \n\nフェイクニュースの検出は、ソース、それらが公開している記事、グラフフレームワークでのソーシャルメディア上のユーザーエンゲージメントの間の関係に関する推論と見なされます。 この情報を埋め込んだ後、ドキュメントの内容とユーザーのエンゲージメントパターンの類似性など、その要素間の観察されていない相互作用を明らかにすることによってグラフエッジを拡張する推論演算子を策定します。 2つの挑戦的なフェイクニュース検出タスクに関する当社の実験では、推論演算子を使用することで、フェイクニュースの拡散を可能にするソーシャルメディアフレームワークをよりよく理解し、パフォーマンスを向上させることが示されています。', 'zh': '易于访问,博速之互动,所以益社交媒体受欢迎也。 然亦使假新闻传为可也,假新闻由新闻来源发之本,指传播错误信息化之信也。 见防大错误信息,持重挑战性也。 \n\n以假新闻检为是源,其发文及图形框架于社交媒体上引用户之理。 既嵌此息,定推理运算符,示其元素之间未察交互(如文档义与用户参式之相似性)以增图边。 二挑战性之假新闻,检事之实验明,推算符以益知社交媒体框架,以成假新闻传,以崇性能。', 'ru': 'Легкий доступ, разнообразие контента и быстрое широкое взаимодействие - вот некоторые из причин, которые делают социальные сети все более популярными. Однако этот рост также позволил распространять фейковые новости, текст, публикуемый источниками новостей с целью распространения дезинформации и влиятельных убеждений. Обнаружение его является важной и сложной проблемой для предотвращения крупномасштабной дезинформации и поддержания здорового общества. \n\nМы рассматриваем обнаружение фейковых новостей как рассуждение об отношениях между источниками, статьями, которые они публикуют, и привлечение пользователей в социальных сетях в рамках графика. После встраивания этой информации мы формулируем операторы вывода, которые увеличивают края графа, выявляя незамеченные взаимодействия между его элементами, такие как сходство между содержимым документов и шаблонами взаимодействия пользователей. Наши эксперименты над двумя сложными задачами обнаружения фейковых новостей показывают, что использование операторов вывода приводит к лучшему пониманию структуры социальных сетей, позволяющей распространять фейковые новости, что приводит к улучшению производительности.', 'ga': 'Tá rochtain éasca, éagsúlacht ábhar, agus idirghníomhaíochtaí tapa forleathan ar chuid de na cúiseanna atá ag éirí níos coitianta leis na meáin shóisialta. Mar sin féin, chuir an t-ardú seo ar a gcumas nuacht bhréige a iomadú, téacs a d’fhoilsigh foinsí nuachta le hintinn faisnéis mhícheart a scaipeadh agus tuairimí a smachtú. Fadhb thábhachtach dhúshlánach is ea é a bhrath chun mífhaisnéis ar mhórscála a chosc agus chun sochaí shláintiúil a choinneáil.\n\nBreathnaímid ar bhrath nuachta bréige mar réasúnaíocht maidir leis an gcaidreamh idir foinsí, na hailt a fhoilsíonn siad, agus rannpháirtíocht úsáideoirí ar na meáin shóisialta i gcreat graf. Tar éis an fhaisnéis seo a leabú, foirmímid oibreoirí tátail a mhéadaíonn imill an ghraif trí idirghníomhaíochtaí neamhbhraite idir na heilimintí a nochtadh, mar chosúlacht idir ábhar doiciméad agus patrúin rannpháirtíochta úsáideoirí. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh thar dhá thasc dúshlánacha braite nuachta bréige go mbíonn tuiscint níos fearr ar chreat na meán sóisialta mar thoradh ar oibreoirí tátal a úsáid, rud a ligeann do scaipeadh nuachta bréige, rud a fhágann go bhfuil feidhmíocht fheabhsaithe ann.', 'hu': 'Az egyszerű hozzáférés, a tartalom változatossága és a gyors széles körű interakciók néhány oka annak, hogy a közösségi média egyre népszerűbbé válik. Ez a növekedés azonban lehetővé tette a hamis hírek terjesztését is, amelyeket hírforrások közzétettek azzal a szándékkal, hogy félrevezető információkat terjesszenek és befolyásolják a hiteket. Ennek felismerése fontos és kihívást jelent a nagyszabású téves tájékoztatás megakadályozása és az egészséges társadalom fenntartása érdekében.', 'el': 'Η εύκολη πρόσβαση, η ποικιλία περιεχομένου και οι γρήγορες διαδεδομένες αλληλεπιδράσεις είναι μερικοί από τους λόγους που κάνουν τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης όλο και πιο δημοφιλή. Ωστόσο, αυτή η άνοδος επέτρεψε επίσης τη διάδοση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων, κειμένων που δημοσιεύονται από πηγές ειδήσεων με σκοπό να διαδώσουν παραπληροφόρηση και να επηρεάσουν τις πεποιθήσεις. Η ανίχνευση της αποτελεί σημαντικό και προκλητικό πρόβλημα για την πρόληψη μεγάλης κλίμακας παραπληροφόρησης και τη διατήρηση μιας υγιούς κοινωνίας.', 'ka': 'მარტივი დახმარება, შემდგომარების განსხვავება, და ძალიან გაფართებული ინტერფექციები არის რამდენიმე მიზეზები, რომლებიც სოციალური მედია უფრო მაგრამ, ეს ზომა ასევე შეუძლია ტალქტური ნუზების გახსნა, ტექსტი გახსნა ნუზების გამოსახულებით, საზოგადოდ გახსნა არასწორი ფორმაცია და გახსნა გულებით. ეს გასანიშვნელოვანი და შესაძლებელი პრობლემაა, რომ გადაწყვეტის დიდი მაგალითის შეცდომის შეცდომება და დარჩენა ჯანმრთელი საზოგადოება.', 'it': "Facile accesso, varietà di contenuti e rapide interazioni diffuse sono alcune delle ragioni che rendono i social media sempre più popolari. Tuttavia, questo aumento ha anche permesso la propagazione di fake news, testo pubblicato da fonti di notizie con l'intento di diffondere disinformazione e influenzare le credenze. Individuarlo è un problema importante e impegnativo per prevenire la disinformazione su larga scala e mantenere una società sana.", 'kk': 'Аяқ қатынау, мазмұның түрлі түрлі және тез таратылған интерфейстері - социалдық медиақтарды көптеген себептерінің бірнеше себептері. Бірақ бұл көтерілген жаңалық жаңалықтарды, жаңалық көзінен шығарылған мәтінді дұрыс мәліметті және сәтті сенімдерді тарату үшін қолданады. Бұл үлкен масштабын қайталау және саулы қоғамды сақтау үшін маңызды және көмектесу мәселесі дегенді анықтау.', 'ms': 'Akses mudah, pelbagai kandungan, dan interaksi luas yang cepat adalah sebab yang membuat media sosial semakin populer. Namun, peningkatan ini juga membolehkan penyebaran berita palsu, teks diterbitkan oleh sumber berita dengan niat untuk menyebarkan maklumat salah dan mengubah keyakinan. Menemukannya adalah masalah penting dan mencabar untuk mencegah maklumat salah skala besar dan menjaga masyarakat yang sehat.', 'ml': 'എളുപ്പമായ സമ്മതം, വിവിധ വിഭവങ്ങളും, വേഗത്തില്\u200d വിശാലമായ വിവരങ്ങളും, സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ പ്രശസ്തമാക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഈ ഉയര്\u200dന്നുപോകുന്നത് കള്ള വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ പ്രഖ്യാപിപ്പിക്കാനും വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കാനും പ്ര വലിയ തെറ്റായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തടഞ്ഞുനിര്\u200dത്തുന്നതും ഒരു സുരക്ഷിതമായ സമൂഹത്തെ സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതും തടഞ്ഞുനിര്\u200dത്ത', 'mt': 'Aċċess faċli, varjetà ta’ kontenut, u interazzjonijiet mifruxa malajr huma wħud mir-raġunijiet li jagħmlu l-midja soċjali dejjem aktar popolari. Madankollu, din iż-żieda ppermettiet ukoll il-propagazzjoni ta’ aħbarijiet foloz, test ippubblikat minn sorsi ta’ aħbarijiet bl-intenzjoni li jinfirxu informazzjoni ħażina u jinfluwenzaw it-twemmin. L-identifikazzjoni hija problem a importanti u ta’ sfida biex tiġi evitata informazzjoni ħa żina fuq skala kbira u tinżamm soċjetà b’saħħitha.', 'mk': 'Лесен пристап, различна содржина и брзи широки интеракции се некои од причините што социјалните медиуми стануваат сé популарни. Сепак, ова зголемување, исто така, овозможи проширување на лажни вести, текст објавен од новинските извори со намера да се шири погрешна информација и да се влијае на верувањата. Детектирањето на тоа е важен и предизвикувачки проблем за спречување на погрешни информации во голем степен и одржување на здраво општество.', 'mn': 'Хялбар хүрэх, төрлийн бүтээгдэхүүн, хурдан өргөн харилцаа нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн зарим шалтгаанууд илүү хүндрэлтэй болгодог. Гэвч энэ нэмэлт нь мөн хуурамч мэдээг, мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрээс хэвлэгдсэн текст буруу мэдээллийг, хуурамч итгэлийг тараах зорилготой болсон. Үүнийг олох нь маш чухал, хэцүү асуудал бөгөөд том хэмжээний буруу хэлбэрийг зогсоох, эрүүл нийгэмдээ хадгалах боломжтой.', 'lt': 'Lengva prieiga, turinio įvairovė ir sparti plačiai paplitusi sąveika yra kai kurios priežastys, dėl kurių socialinė žiniasklaida tampa vis populiaresnė. Tačiau šis padidėjimas taip pat padėjo skleisti suklastotas naujienas, naujienų šaltinių paskelbtą tekstą, siekiant skleisti klaidingą informaciją ir paveikti tikėjimus. Svarbi ir sunki problem a – užkirsti kelią didelės apimties klaidingai informacijai ir išlaikyti sveiką visuomenę.', 'pl': 'Łatwy dostęp, różnorodność treści i szybkie powszechne interakcje to niektóre z powodów, dla których media społecznościowe stają się coraz popularne. Jednak ten wzrost umożliwił również rozpowszechnianie fałszywych wiadomości, tekstów publikowanych przez źródła wiadomości z zamiarem rozpowszechniania dezinformacji i przekonań. Wykrycie tego problemu jest ważnym i wyzwaniem w celu zapobiegania dezinformacji na dużą skalę i utrzymania zdrowego społeczeństwa.', 'no': 'Ein enkel tilgang, variasjon av innhald og rask spredt samarbeid er nokre av grunnene til å gjera sosiale mediar større populært. Men denne økninga har også slått på å propagasjona av falske nyhetar, teksten som er publisert av nyhetsikjelder med hjelp til å spreda feil informasjon og søk-troff. Å oppdage det er ein viktig og vanskeleg problem for å forebygge store skala feilformasjon og vedlikehalde ein helse samfunn.', 'ro': 'Accesul ușor, varietatea de conținut și interacțiunile rapide pe scară largă sunt unele dintre motivele care fac ca rețelele sociale să fie tot mai populare. Cu toate acestea, această creștere a permis, de asemenea, propagarea știrilor false, text publicat de surse de știri cu intenția de a răspândi dezinformare și influența convingerile. Detectarea acesteia reprezintă o problemă importantă și provocatoare pentru prevenirea dezinformării la scară largă și menținerea unei societăți sănătoase.', 'sr': 'Lako pristup, raznolikost sadržaja i brzo široke interakcije su neki od razloga zbog kojih socijalni mediji postaju popularniji. Međutim, taj rast je takođe omogućio proširenje lažnih vijesti, tekst objavljen novinskim izvorima sa namjerom da se širi nepravedno informacije i pretvaranje verovanja. Otkrivanje je važan i izazovan problem sprečavanja velike pogrešne informacije i održavanja zdravog društva.', 'so': 'Easy access, variety of content, and fast widespread interactions are some of the reasons making social media increasingly popular.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee koritaankanu wuxuu sidoo kale u caawiyey ogeysiinta warqada been ah, warqada warqada ee warqada ka soo daabacay, wuxuuna ku talo galay in la kala bixiyo macluumaad khalad ah iyo aaminnimo badan. Aqoonsashadu waa dhibaato muhiim ah oo dhibaato adag ah in uu ka hor maro macluumaad khalad ah oo aad u badan iyo in uu ilaaliyo bulshada caafimaadka.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාව වැඩියෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්, විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඉක්මනින් විස්තර සම නමුත්, මේ වැඩේ සමහරවිට බොරු වාර්තාවේ ප්\u200dරකාශනය සක්\u200dරිය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ වැරදි ඒක හොයාගන්න එක වැදගත් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැරැද්ධ වැරැද්ධ වැරැද්ධ වෙන්න ස', 'sv': 'Enkel åtkomst, mångfald av innehåll och snabba utbredda interaktioner är några av anledningarna till att sociala medier blir alltmer populära. Emellertid har denna ökning också möjliggjort spridning av falska nyheter, text publicerad av nyhetskällor med avsikt att sprida vilseledande information och påverka övertygelser. Att upptäcka det är ett viktigt och utmanande problem för att förhindra storskalig missinformation och upprätthålla ett hälsosamt samhälle.', 'ur': 'آسان دسترسی، مختلف موجودات اور سریع پھیلا ہوا ارتباط ہے، سوسیل میڈیا کو زیادہ مشهور بنانے کے سبب ہیں. However, this growth has also enabled the propagation of fake news, text published by news sources with a intention to spread misinformation and sway beliefs. یہ ایک اہم اور مشکل ہے کہ بڑے اندازے کے غلط اندازے سے روکنے اور سلامتی اجتماعی حفاظت کرنے کے لئے۔', 'ta': 'சுலபமான அணுகல், பல்வேறு உள்ளடக்கங்கள், மற்றும் வேகமான விரிவான இடைவெளிப்பாடுகள் சில காரணங்களாகும் சமூக ஊடகங்கள் அதிகமா ஆனால், இந்த உயர்வு பொய் செய்திகளை வெளிப்படுத்தும், செய்தி மூலம் வெளிப்படையிட்ட உரையை செயல்படுத்தி தவறான தகவல் மற்றும் பிரச்ச இதை கண்டுபிடிக்க முக்கியமான மற்றும் சவாலிக்கையான பிரச்சனையாகும் பெரிய அளவு தவறான தகவலை தடுக்க மற்றும் ஒர', 'uz': "Name Lekin, bu ko'paytirish xato haqida o'ylab keladigan xabar, xabar manbaslari tomonidan ochilgan matnni amalga oshirish mumkin. Bu katta ko'pchilik xato haqida xabar qilish va sog'lom jamiyatni davom etish uchun muhim va murakkab muammo.", 'vi': 'Dễ dàng truy cập, đa dạng nội dung, và liên hệ nhanh và rộng rãi là một số lý do khiến các phương tiện xã hội ngày càng phổ biến. Tuy nhiên, sự gia tăng này cũng đã cho phép truyền bá tin giả, văn bản được phát hành bởi nguồn tin tức với mục đích lan truyền tin sai lầm và khống chế tín ngưỡng. Việc phát hiện nó là một vấn đề quan trọng và đầy thử thách nhằm ngăn chặn tin tưởng lớn và duy trì một xã hội lành mạnh.', 'bg': 'Лесният достъп, разнообразието от съдържание и бързото разпространено взаимодействие са някои от причините, поради които социалните медии стават все по-популярни. Това повишение обаче позволи и разпространението на фалшиви новини, текст публикуван от източници на новини с цел разпространение на дезинформация и повлияване на вярванията. Откриването му е важен и предизвикателен проблем за предотвратяване на дезинформацията в голям мащаб и поддържане на здраво общество.', 'da': 'Nem adgang, mangfoldighed af indhold og hurtige udbredte interaktioner er nogle af grundene til at gøre sociale medier mere populære. Men denne stigning har også gjort det muligt at sprede falske nyheder, tekst udgivet af nyhedskilder med henblik på at sprede misinformation og påvirke overbevisninger. At opdage det er et vigtigt og udfordrende problem at forebygge storstilet misinformation og opretholde et sundt samfund.', 'hr': 'Lako pristup, raznolikost sadržaja i brzo široke interakcije su neki od razloga zbog kojih socijalni mediji postaju popularniji. Međutim, taj rast je također omogućio proširenje lažnih vijesti, tekst objavljen novinskim izvorima sa namjerom proširiti pogrešnu informaciju i povjerenja. Otkrivanje je važan i izazovan problem sprečavanja velike pogrešne informacije i održavanja zdravog društva.', 'nl': 'Gemakkelijke toegang, verscheidenheid aan content en snelle wijdverspreide interacties zijn enkele van de redenen waarom sociale media steeds populairder worden. Deze stijging heeft echter ook de verspreiding van nepnieuws mogelijk gemaakt, tekst gepubliceerd door nieuwsbronnen met de bedoeling verkeerde informatie te verspreiden en overtuigingen te beïnvloeden. Het opsporen ervan is een belangrijk en uitdagend probleem om grootschalige misinformatie te voorkomen en een gezonde samenleving te behouden.', 'ko': '편리한 방문, 다양한 내용과 신속하고 광범위한 상호작용은 소셜 미디어가 갈수록 인기를 얻는 몇 가지 원인이다.그러나 이런 상승으로 인해 허위 뉴스가 전파되었다. 즉, 뉴스 출처가 발표한 텍스트는 잘못된 정보를 전파하고 신앙을 흔들기 위한 것이다.대규모의 잘못된 정보를 방지하고 건강한 사회를 유지하기 위해 검측은 중요하고 도전적인 문제이다.', 'id': 'Akses mudah, berbagai konten, dan interaksi yang cepat menyebar adalah beberapa alasan membuat media sosial semakin populer. Namun, peningkatan ini juga memungkinkan penyebaran berita palsu, teks yang diterbitkan oleh sumber berita dengan niat untuk menyebarkan informasi yang salah dan mempengaruhi keyakinan. Mengeteksi itu adalah masalah penting dan menantang untuk mencegah informasi yang salah skala besar dan mempertahankan masyarakat yang sehat.', 'de': 'Einfacher Zugriff, vielfältige Inhalte und schnelle Interaktionen sind einige der Gründe, warum soziale Medien immer beliebter werden. Dieser Anstieg hat jedoch auch die Verbreitung von Fake News ermöglicht, Texten, die von Nachrichtenquellen veröffentlicht werden, um Fehlinformationen zu verbreiten und Überzeugungen zu beeinflussen. Sie zu erkennen ist ein wichtiges und herausforderndes Problem, um große Fehlinformationen zu verhindern und eine gesunde Gesellschaft zu erhalten.', 'fa': 'دسترسی آسان، مختلف محتویات، و تعاملات سریع گسترش گسترش، بعضی از دلایل\u200cهایی است که رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی بیشتر مشهور می\u200cشود. با این حال، این افزایش همچنین اخبار دروغ را فعال کرده است، متن که توسط منبع خبری منتشر شده است، با هدف گسترش غلطی و اعتقاد غلطی است. کشف کردن این یک مشکل مهم و سخت\u200cگیری است تا جلوی تغییر اندازه\u200cهای بزرگ و حفظ یک جامعه سالم باشد.', 'sw': 'Upatikanaji rahisi, aina mbalimbali za maudhui na mahusiano yanayoenea kwa kasi ni baadhi ya sababu zinazozifanya mitandao ya kijamii kuwa maarufu zaidi. Hata hivyo, ongezeko hili pia limewaweza kutangaza habari potofu, maandishi yaliyochapishwa na vyanzo vya habari kwa lengo la kusambaza taarifa za uovu na imani mbaya. Kugundua ni tatizo muhimu na changamoto la kuzuia taarifa za uovu kwa kiasi kikubwa na kuendelea jamii ya afya.', 'tr': 'Ýuwaşlyk ýetmek, dürli manylyklar we tiz daşyrylyklar sosyal mediýalary köpräk meýilleşdirýän sebäpleriniň käbir sebäbi. Ýöne bu ýokary hem ýalňyş haberler täze etmäge mümkin edýär. Täzelikler tarapyndan ýalňyşlyk we süýtgeşik ynamlaryň bejermesi üçin janlaşdyrylýar. Muny uly ölçek ýalňyşlygy önlemek we saglykly jemgyýeti goramak üçin wajyp we çözgütli mesele däldir.', 'sq': 'Easy access, variety of content, and fast widespread interactions are some of the reasons making social media increasingly popular.  Megjithatë, kjo rritje ka mundësuar gjithashtu përhapjen e lajmeve të rreme, teksteve të botuara nga burimet e lajmeve me qëllim të përhapë informata të gabuara dhe të ndikojë besimet. Duke e zbuluar është një problem i rëndësishëm dhe sfidues për të parandaluar gabimet në shkallë të madhe dhe për të mbajtur një shoqëri të shëndetshme.', 'af': "Eenvoudige toegang, verskillende inhoud en vinnige verspreidige interaksies is sommige van die rede wat sosiale media vergroot populaar maak. Maar hierdie opstanding het ook die propagasie van falske nuus geaktiveer, teks gepubliseer deur nuusbronne met 'n doel om misformasie en sway geloof te versprei. Om dit te ontdek is 'n belangrike en aanvaardige probleem om groot skaal misformasie te voorkom en 'n gesond samelewing te hou.", 'hy': 'Պատճառներն են, որ սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները ավելի հանրահայտ են դարձնում: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս աճը նաև հնարավորություն է տալիս կեղծ նորությունների, նորությունների աղբյուրների կողմից հրատարակված տեքստի տարածումը, որպեսզի տարածվի սխալ ինֆորմացիա և փոխանցվի համոզմունքները: Դա կարևոր և դժվար խնդիր է խոչընդոտել մեծ մասշտաբով սխալ տեղեկատվություն և պահպանել առողջ հասարակություն:', 'az': 'Yaxınlıq əlaqəsi, müxtəlif məlumatlar və hızlı genişlənmiş əlaqələr sosyal məlumatların bəzi səbəblərini daha popularlıq etməkdir. Lakin bu yüksək də sahte xəbərlərin yayılmasını qabilleşdirdi, xəbər kaynaqlarından yayılmış məktub haqsızlıq və küfr inançlarını yaymaq niyyətində yayılmışdır. Böyük ölçüdə yanlış informasyonu öndərmək və sağlam bir toplum qorumaq mümkün və çətin bir problemdir.', 'am': 'ቀላል ማግኘት፣ የተለያዩ ጥያቄ እና በተሰፋው ጥያቄ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ሲያበዛ የሚታወቅ ምክንያቶች አንዳንድ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ይህ ማስታወቂያ የሐሰት ዜና አሰብቷል፣ የስህተት መረጃ እና የሽፋን እምነት ለመዘርጋት የዜና ምንጮች የተለወጠውን ጽሑፍ አበረታታል፡፡ ብዙ የስሕተት መረጃዎችን ለመከላከል እና ጤና ማኅበረሰብ ለመጠበቅ የሚያስፈልገው መከራ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'সহজে প্রবেশ, বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তু এবং দ্রুত বিস্তৃত ইন্টারনেকশন হচ্ছে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম বাড়তে থাকার কারণ। তবে এই বাড়তি মিথ্যা সংবাদ প্রচারণার ব্যাপারে সক্রিয় করেছে, সংবাদ সূত্র প্রকাশিত টেক্সট প্রকাশিত হয়েছে, যার উদ্দেশ্যে ভুল তথ এটা খুঁজে বের করা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং চ্যালেঞ্জের সমস্যা, বিশাল পর্যায়ে ভুল তথ্য প্রতিরোধ করা এবং স্বাস্থ্য', 'bs': 'Lako pristup, raznolikost sadržaja i brzo široke interakcije su neki razlozi zbog kojih socijalni mediji postaju popularniji. Međutim, taj rast je također omogućio proširenje lažnih vijesti, tekst objavljen novinskim izvorima sa namjerom proširiti pogrešnu informaciju i povjerenja. Otkrivanje je važan i izazovan problem sprečavanja velike nepravde i održavanja zdravog društva.', 'ca': "L'accés fàcil, la varietat de continguts i les interaccions ràpids i generalitzats són algunes de les raons per les quals els mitjans socials es fan cada cop més populars. Tot i així, aquest alçament també ha permet la propagació de notícies falses, textos publicats per fonts de notícies amb l'intenció de difundir la mala informació i influenciar les creences. Detectar-lo és un problem a important i desafiant prevenir la mala informació a gran escala i mantenir una societat saludable.", 'cs': 'Snadný přístup, rozmanitost obsahu a rychlé rozšířené interakce jsou některé z důvodů, proč sociální média jsou stále populárnější. Tento vzestup však také umožnil šíření falešných zpráv, textu publikovaného zpravodajskými zdroji s úmyslem šířit dezinformace a ovlivňovat přesvědčení. Odhalování tohoto problému je důležitým a náročným problémem zabránit širokému rozsahu dezinformací a udržet zdravou společnost.', 'et': 'Lihtne juurdepääs, sisu mitmekesisus ja kiire laialdane suhtlus on mõned põhjused, miks sotsiaalmeedia populaarsemaks muutub. See tõus on aga võimaldanud levitada ka valeuudiste tekste, mida avaldavad uudisteallikad eesmärgiga levitada valeinformatsiooni ja mõjutada uskumusi. Selle avastamine on oluline ja keeruline probleem, et vältida ulatuslikku valeteavet ja säilitada terve ühiskonna.', 'fi': 'Helppo pääsy, sisällön monipuolisuus ja nopea laaja vuorovaikutus ovat joitakin syitä, joiden vuoksi sosiaalinen media on yhä suositumpi. Tämä nousu on kuitenkin mahdollistanut myös valeuutisten leviämisen, uutislähteiden julkaiseman tekstin, jonka tarkoituksena on levittää väärää tietoa ja vaikuttaa uskomuksiin. Sen havaitseminen on tärkeä ja haastava ongelma estää laajamittaista väärinkäsitystä ja ylläpitää tervettä yhteiskuntaa.', 'jv': 'lah Nanging, lak iki lak mulai perbudhakan omah gak bukane, teks pirsak mengko percokot nan alam sing nganggep nggawe informasi lan nglanggar barang kejahatan Ngawe ngilangno-ngopo kuwi tenan nganggo cah-cah dumadhi kuwi nggawe kethok sing apik tur angel gak bener', 'sk': 'Enostaven dostop, raznolikost vsebin in hitra razširjena interakcija so nekateri od razlogov, zaradi katerih so družbena omrežja vse bolj priljubljena. Vendar pa je ta porast omogočila tudi širjenje lažnih novic, besedil, ki jih objavljajo viri novic z namenom širjenja napačnih informacij in prepričanj. Odkrivanje je pomemben in zahteven problem preprečevanja obsežnih napačnih informacij in ohranjanja zdrave družbe.', 'ha': "Ina sau쿷i da ha톙i, masu ha톙uwa masu cikin 쿷unci da kuma masu fa톙i da haraka, masu yiwuwa ne daga sababin da za'a 쿷ara umarin mitandai da jamii. Ha쿷캴쿷a, wannan t칚shi ya fara the promotion of fake news, text that was Publishing by sources of news with an aim to circle misinformation and sway imani. Ina gane cewa matsayi mai muhimu da mai zartar da hani ga hani jama'a mai girma ma'ab콜cin 쿷arya kuma yana tsari jamii mai kyau.", 'he': 'גישה קלה, מגוון של תוכן, ואינטראקציות מפורסמות מהר הם חלק מהסיבות שהופכות מדיה חברתית לפופולרית. עם זאת, העלייה הזאת גם אפשרה להפיצה של חדשות מזויפות, טקסט שפורסם על ידי מקורות חדשות עם כוונה להפיץ מידע לא נכון ולהשפיע באמונות. הבחינה היא בעיה חשובה ומתגידה למנוע מידע לא נכון במידה גדולה ולשמור על חברה בריאה.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་ནང་དོན་འདྲ་ཞིག་ནི་མཐར་འགྱུར་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གཞན་ཞིག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཡར་རྒྱས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ཁྱད་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ལ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་བྱས་ཡོད། འདི་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་དང་གནད་དོན་ཁག'}
{'en': 'Just Rank Rethinking Evaluation with Word and Sentence Similarities', 'ar': 'فهم التحيز الجنساني في حفلات الزفاف في قاعدة المعرفة', 'fr': 'Comprendre les préjugés sexistes dans les intégrations de la base de connaissances', 'pt': 'Entendendo o preconceito de gênero nas incorporações da base de conhecimento', 'es': 'Comprensión de los prejuicios de género en las incorporaciones', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの埋め込みにおけるジェンダーバイアスの理解', 'ru': 'Понимание гендерных предрассудков во внедрении базы знаний', 'zh': '知知识库嵌中性别偏见', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस एम्बेडिंग में लिंग पूर्वाग्रह को समझना', 'ga': 'Tuiscint ar Laofacht Inscne i Leabú Bhonn Eolais', 'ka': 'Gender Bias- ს ცნობიერების ბაზის შესაბამისათვის გაგრძელება', 'el': 'Κατανόηση της προκατάληψης των φύλων σε ενσωμάτωση βάσης γνώσης', 'hu': 'A nemek közötti eltérések megértése a tudásbázis beágyazásaiban', 'it': 'Comprendere le bias di genere negli embedding della Knowledge Base', 'lt': 'Suvokti lyčių skirtumus įdiegiant žinias', 'kk': 'Білім негізгі ендірулерінде Gender Bias- ды түсіну', 'ms': 'Memahami Bias Gender dalam Penciptaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ജെന്റര്\u200d ബിയാസുകള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Understanding Gender Bias in Knowledge Base Embeddings', 'mk': 'Разбирање на полските непријатности во вградувањата на базата на знаење', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь нэмэгдүүлэлт дээр гендер биas-г ойлгох', 'pl': 'Zrozumienie uprzedzeń płci w bazie wiedzy', 'no': 'For å forstå generelle byar i kunnskapsbaseinnlegg', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea Bias de gen în încorporarea bazei de cunoștințe', 'sr': 'Razumevanje Gender Bias u osnovama baze znanja', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Waxgarashada jinsiga ee ku qoran cilmiga aasaasiga ah', 'sv': 'Att förstå könsfördelningen i kunskapsbasen', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையில் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பொழுது', 'ur': 'علم Base Embeddings میں جنس بیس کا سمجھنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nắm bắt cán cân trong môi trường nền Kiến thức', 'bg': 'Разбиране на половите наклонности в вграждането на базата данни от знания', 'nl': 'Inzicht in gender bias in kennisdatabases', 'hr': 'Razumijevanje Gender Bias u integraciji baze znanja', 'da': 'Forståelse af kønsfordele i indlejringer af videnbase', 'de': 'Verständnis von Gender Bias in Knowledge Base Embeddings', 'id': 'Memahami Kesalahan Gender dalam Penciptaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리에 삽입된 성별 편견을 이해하다', 'fa': 'درک بیس جنسی در پایه دانش', 'sw': 'Kuelewa Bias ya jinsia katika Mipango ya Ujuzi', 'tr': 'Bilim གཞ larynda Genjer Biýasyny düşünmek', 'af': 'Verstaan Gender Bias in kennisbasis inbêdings', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i dëmtimeve të gjinit në përfshirjet e bazës së njohurive', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'hy': 'Understanding Gender Bias in Knowledge Base Embeddings', 'az': 'Bilim Üstündə Gender Bias anlama', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিতে লিঙ্গ বায়াস বুঝতে পারে', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje Gender Bias u integraciji baze znanja', 'ca': 'Entendre els inconvenients de gènere en les integracions basades en el coneixement', 'cs': 'Porozumění genderovým předpokladům v vložení znalostní báze', 'fi': 'Sukupuolinäkökohtien ymmärtäminen tietokantojen upotuksissa', 'et': 'Soolise võrdõiguslikkuse mõistmine teabebaasi põimimistes', 'he': 'להבין סבלנות מין בתכניות בסיס הידע', 'jv': 'Bilih Gender Bias nang ambadusé Bilih', 'sk': 'Razumevanje pristranskosti med spoloma v vdelavah zbirke znanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཤེས་པའི་གཞི་རྟེན་ཀྱི་ཨ་རིམ་ནང་གི་Gender Bias་ལ་རྟོགས་བཞག་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Word and sentence embeddings are useful feature representations in natural language processing However intrinsic evaluation for embeddings lags far behind and there has been no significant update since the past decade Word and sentence similarity tasks have become the de facto evaluation method It leads models to overfit to such evaluations negatively impacting embedding models development This paper first points out the problems using semantic similarity as the gold standard for word and sentence embedding evaluations Further we propose a new intrinsic evaluation method called EvalRank which shows a much stronger correlation with downstream tasks Extensive experiments are conducted based on models and popular datasets to certify our judgments Finally the practical evaluation toolkit is released for future benchmarking purposes', 'ar': 'ثبت أن حفلات الزفاف في قاعدة المعرفة (KB) تحتوي على تحيزات بين الجنسين. في هذه الورقة ، ندرس سؤالين بخصوص هذه التحيزات: كيف نحددها كميًا ، وكيف نتتبع أصولها في KB؟ على وجه التحديد ، أولاً ، نقوم بتطوير مقياسين جديدين للتحيز على التوالي لمجموعة من الكيانات الشخصية وكيان شخصي فردي. يتم ملاحظة الدليل على صحتها من خلال المقارنة مع بيانات التعداد في العالم الحقيقي. ثانيًا ، نستخدم وظيفة التأثير لفحص مساهمة كل ثلاثية في KB في تحيز المجموعة الكلي. لتجسيد التطبيقات المحتملة لدراستنا ، نقدم أيضًا استراتيجيتين (عن طريق إضافة وإزالة ثلاثة أضعاف KB) للتخفيف من التحيزات بين الجنسين في حفلات زفاف KB.', 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que las incorporaciones de la base de conocimientos (KB) contienen sesgos de género. En este artículo, estudiamos dos cuestiones relacionadas con estos sesgos: ¿cómo cuantificarlos y cómo rastrear sus orígenes en KB? Específicamente, primero, desarrollamos dos nuevas medidas de sesgo, respectivamente, para un grupo de entidades de personas y una entidad de persona individual. La evidencia de su validez se observa en comparación con los datos del censo del mundo real. En segundo lugar, utilizamos la función de influencia para inspeccionar la contribución de cada triple en KB al sesgo general del grupo. Para ejemplificar las posibles aplicaciones de nuestro estudio, también presentamos dos estrategias (mediante la adición y eliminación de tripletes de KB) para mitigar los sesgos de género en las incorporaciones de la base de conocimientos.', 'pt': 'Foi demonstrado que as incorporações da base de conhecimento (KB) contêm preconceitos de gênero. Neste artigo, estudamos duas questões sobre esses vieses: como quantificá-los e como rastrear suas origens em KB? Especificamente, primeiro, desenvolvemos duas novas medidas de viés, respectivamente, para um grupo de entidades de pessoa e uma entidade de pessoa individual. A evidência de sua validade é observada por comparação com dados do censo do mundo real. Em segundo lugar, usamos a função de influência para inspecionar a contribuição de cada triplo em KB para o viés geral do grupo. Para exemplificar as aplicações potenciais de nosso estudo, também apresentamos duas estratégias (adicionando e removendo triplos KB) para mitigar preconceitos de gênero em incorporações de KB.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que les intégrations de la base de connaissances contiennent des préjugés sexistes. Dans cet article, nous étudions deux questions concernant ces biais\xa0: comment les quantifier et comment retracer leurs origines dans KB\xa0? Tout d'abord, nous développons deux nouvelles mesures de biais respectivement pour un groupe d'entités personnelles et une entité individuelle. La preuve de leur validité est observée par comparaison avec les données de recensement du monde réel. Ensuite, nous utilisons la fonction d'influence pour inspecter la contribution de chaque triple en Ko au biais global du groupe. Pour illustrer les applications potentielles de notre étude, nous présentons également deux stratégies (en ajoutant et en supprimant des triplets de connaissances) pour atténuer les préjugés sexistes dans les intégrations de KB.", 'ja': 'ナレッジベース（ KB ）の埋め込みには、性別の偏見が含まれていることが示されています。この論文では、これらのバイアスに関する2つの質問を研究します。つまり、それらを定量化する方法と、KBでそれらの起源を追跡する方法です。具体的には、まず、個人エンティティのグループと個人エンティティのグループについて、それぞれ2つの新規のバイアス対策を開発します。それらの妥当性の証拠は、現実の国勢調査データとの比較によって観察される。第二に、影響関数を使用して、KB単位の各トリプルがグループ全体のバイアスに寄与しているかどうかを調べます。私たちの研究の潜在的な応用を例示するために、KB埋め込みにおけるジェンダーバイアスを軽減するための2つの戦略（ KBトリプルの追加と削除）も提示します。', 'zh': '知识库 (KB) 嵌已证性别偏见。 于本文,究其差二:何以量化之,何以迹其KB? 具体来说,先为一朋一体,与一人实体开两新偏见测量。 以比世界人口普查数,观其有效性证。 其次,用影响函数以检三元组(以 KB 为单)偏差之献。 为说潜行用两策(添删KB三元组)减KB嵌。', 'ru': 'Было показано, что вложения в базу знаний (БЗ) содержат гендерные предубеждения. В этой статье мы изучаем два вопроса, касающиеся этих смещений: как их количественно оценить и как проследить их происхождение в КБ? В частности, во-первых, мы разрабатываем две новые меры смещения, соответственно, для группы физических лиц и отдельного юридического лица. Доказательства их достоверности наблюдаются путем сопоставления с данными реальных переписей населения. Во-вторых, мы используем функцию влияния для проверки вклада каждой тройки в КБ в общее групповое смещение. Чтобы проиллюстрировать потенциальные приложения нашего исследования, мы также представляем две стратегии (добавляя и удаляя тройные КБ) для смягчения гендерных предубеждений во вложениях КБ.', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस (KB) एम्बेडिंग को लिंग पूर्वाग्रहों को शामिल करने के लिए दिखाया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम इन पूर्वाग्रहों के बारे में दो प्रश्नों का अध्ययन करते हैं: उन्हें कैसे निर्धारित किया जाए, और केबी में उनकी उत्पत्ति का पता कैसे लगाया जाए? विशेष रूप से, सबसे पहले, हम व्यक्ति संस्थाओं और एक व्यक्तिगत व्यक्ति इकाई के एक समूह के लिए क्रमशः दो उपन्यास पूर्वाग्रह उपाय विकसित करते हैं। उनकी वैधता के सबूत वास्तविक दुनिया की जनगणना के आंकड़ों के साथ तुलना करके देखे जाते हैं। दूसरा, हम समग्र समूह पूर्वाग्रह के लिए KB में प्रत्येक ट्रिपल के योगदान का निरीक्षण करने के लिए प्रभाव फ़ंक्शन का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे अध्ययन के संभावित अनुप्रयोगों का उदाहरण देने के लिए, हम केबी एम्बेडिंग में लिंग पूर्वाग्रहों को कम करने के लिए दो रणनीतियों (केबी ट्रिपल को जोड़कर और हटाकर) भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá sé léirithe go bhfuil laofachtaí inscne i neadú an Bhonn Eolais (KB). Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar dhá cheist maidir leis na laofachtaí seo: conas iad a chainníochtú, agus conas a mbunús a rianú i KB? Go sonrach, ar dtús, forbraímid dhá bheart laofachta núíosacha faoi seach le haghaidh grúpa eintiteas duine agus aonán duine aonair. Breathnaítear fianaise ar a mbailíocht trí chomparáid a dhéanamh le sonraí daonáirimh an domhain fíor. Ar an dara dul síos, bainimid úsáid as an bhfeidhm tionchair chun iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar an méid a chuireann gach triple i KB le claonadh foriomlán an ghrúpa. Chun feidhmiú féideartha ár staidéar a léiriú, cuirimid dhá straitéis i láthair freisin (trí líon trí KB a chur leis agus a bhaint) chun laofachtaí inscne i leabaithe KB a mhaolú.', 'hu': 'A tudásbázis (KB) beágyazásai kimutatták, hogy nemi előítéleteket tartalmaznak. Ebben a tanulmányban két kérdést tanulmányozunk ezekkel az előítéletekkel kapcsolatban: hogyan lehet számszerűsíteni őket, és hogyan lehet nyomon követni az eredetüket KB-ban? Konkrétan először is két új elfogultsági mérést dolgozunk ki egy személyi entitáscsoport és egy egyéni személyi entitás számára. Az érvényességüket a valós népszámlálási adatokkal összehasonlítva bizonyítják. Másodszor, a befolyási függvényt használjuk arra, hogy megvizsgáljuk az egyes hármas KB-ban kifejezett hozzájárulását az általános csoportelfogultsághoz. Tanulmányunk potenciális alkalmazásainak példájához két stratégiát is bemutatunk (a KB-háromszorok hozzáadásával és eltávolításával) a KB-beágyazások nemi előítéleteinek enyhítésére.', 'el': 'Έχει αποδειχθεί ότι οι ενσωματώσεις στη βάση γνώσης (ΚΒ) περιέχουν προκατάληψη φύλου. Στην παρούσα εργασία μελετάμε δύο ερωτήματα σχετικά με αυτές τις προκαταλήψεις: πώς να τις ποσοτικοποιήσουμε και πώς να εντοπίσουμε την προέλευσή τους στην ΚΒ; Συγκεκριμένα, πρώτα αναπτύσσουμε δύο νέα μέτρα προκατάλειψης αντίστοιχα για μια ομάδα οντοτήτων προσώπου και μια ατομική οντότητα προσώπου. Η εγκυρότητά τους παρατηρείται σε σύγκριση με δεδομένα απογραφής πραγματικού κόσμου. Δεύτερον, χρησιμοποιούμε τη λειτουργία επιρροής για να επιθεωρήσουμε τη συμβολή κάθε τριπλού στην ΚΒ στη συνολική προκατάληψη της ομάδας. Για να υποδειγματίσουμε τις πιθανές εφαρμογές της μελέτης μας, παρουσιάζουμε επίσης δύο στρατηγικές (προσθέτοντας και αφαιρώντας τριπλάσια ΚΒ) για να μετριάσουμε τις προκατάληψη φύλου στις ενσωμάτωση ΚΒ.', 'ka': 'Name ჩვენ ამ დოკუნტში ორი კითხვების შესახებ ვისწავლოთ: როგორ გავაკეთოთ და როგორ გავაკეთოთ ისინი პირობლის KB-ში? პირველად, ჩვენ განვითარებთ ორი პრომენტური წარმოდგენების განმავლობაში ადამიანის ჯგუფი და ადამიანის განმავლობაში. მათი მნიშვნელობის წარმოდგენების გამოყენება რეალური მსოფლიოს ცენსის მონაცემებით. მეორე, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ინტერფექციის ფუნქცია, რომელიც KB-ში ყოველ სამჯერ დამატებულების დამატებისთვის. ჩვენი სწავლის პოტენციალური პროგრამების გამოსახულებლად, ჩვენ ასევე ორი სტრატიგია (KB სამჯერ დამატებით და წაშლაით) KB-ს დამატებით გენდერის წარმოდგენების შემცირებ', 'it': "È stato dimostrato che le incorporazioni della Knowledge Base (KB) contengono pregiudizi di genere. In questo articolo, studiamo due domande riguardanti questi pregiudizi: come quantificarli, e come tracciare le loro origini in KB? Nello specifico, in primo luogo, sviluppiamo due nuove misure di bias rispettivamente per un gruppo di entità fisiche e per un'entità individuale. La prova della loro validità è osservata confrontando i dati del censimento del mondo reale. In secondo luogo, utilizziamo la funzione influenza per ispezionare il contributo di ogni triplo in KB al bias complessivo del gruppo. Per esemplificare le potenziali applicazioni del nostro studio, presentiamo anche due strategie (aggiungendo e rimuovendo tripli KB) per mitigare i pregiudizi di genere nelle incorporazioni KB.", 'lt': 'Įrodyta, kad žinių bazės (KB) įtraukose yra lyčių pusiausvyros. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame du klausimus dėl šių pusiausvyrų: kaip juos kiekybiškai įvertinti ir kaip atsekti jų kilmę KB? Konkrečiai, pirmiausia mes parengiame atitinkamai dvi naujas šališkumo priemones asmens subjektų grupei ir atskiram asmens subjektui. Jų galiojimo įrodymai pateikiami lyginant su realiojo pasaulio surašymo duomenimis. Antra, mes naudojame įtakos funkciją, kad patikrintume kiekvieno trigubo KB indėlį į bendrą grupių pusiausvyrą. Norėdami pavyzdį parodyti galimas mūsų tyrimo taikymo sritis, taip pat pristatysime dvi strategijas (papildant ir pašalinant KB trigubus) siekiant sušvelninti lyčių pusiausvyrą į KB įtraukimą.', 'mk': 'Прикажано е дека вградувањата на базата на знаење (KB) содржат полски предрасуди. Во овој весник, студираме два прашања во врска со овие предрасуди: како да ги квантификуваме и како да ги следиме нивните потекла во КБ? Специфично, прво, развиваме две нови мерки на предрасуд, односно за група лични ентитети и индивидуални лични ентитети. Доказите за нивната валидност се набљудуваат во споредба со податоците од пописот на реалниот свет. Второ, ја користиме функцијата на влијание за да го провериме придонесот на секој трипат во КБ за целокупната групна пристрасност. За да ги примериме потенцијалните апликации на нашата студија, ние, исто така, претставуваме две стратегии (со додавање и отстранување на трипати на КБ) за олеснување на полските предрасуди во вклучувањето на КБ.', 'kk': 'Мәлімет негізінде (KB) ендіру гендерлік белсендіктері бар. Бұл қағазда, біз осы қарсы туралы екі сұрақ зерттейміз: оларды қалай өлшемдеу және олардың басталығын КБ-де қалай іздеу? Біріншіден, біріншіден біз адамдардың тобына және адамдардың бөлімі үшін екі романдық тәртіпсіздік өлшемін жасадық. Олардың дұрыстығының дұрыстығын көрсету үшін шын әлемдік сансу деректерімен салыстырылады. Екіншіден, біз КБ-де әрбір үш рет қатынасын бақылау үшін бүкіл топтың қатынасына қатынасын тексеру функциясын қолданамыз. Біздің зерттеулеріміздің мүмкіндік қолданбаларын мысалдыру үшін, сондай-ақ КБ индебингінде гендердің қарсылығын көшірмелеу үшін екі стратегия (КБ үшегін қосу мен өшіру үшін).', 'ms': 'Knowledge base (KB) embeddings have been shown to contain gender biases.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari dua soalan mengenai biases ini: bagaimana untuk kuantifikasikan mereka, dan bagaimana untuk mengesan asal mereka dalam KB? Secara khusus, pertama, kita mengembangkan dua tindakan bias novel secara berdasarkan untuk kumpulan entiti orang dan entiti individu. Bukti kebenaran mereka diperhatikan dengan perbandingan dengan data census dunia nyata. Kedua, kita gunakan fungsi pengaruh untuk memeriksa kontribusi setiap tiga kali dalam KB kepada bias kumpulan keseluruhan. Untuk mengumpulkan aplikasi potensi kajian kami, kami juga memperkenalkan dua strategi (dengan menambah dan membuang tiga KB) untuk mengurangi bias jenis dalam kandungan KB.', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനം (കെബി) പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പെരുമാറ്റാന്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു: എങ്ങനെയാണ് അവയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത്, എങ്ങനെയാണ് കെബിയില്\u200d അവരുടെ അട പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു നോവല്\u200d പിശാചുക്കളുടെ പ്രകൃതികള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വ്യക്തിക സ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക സെന്\u200dസ് ഡേറ്റാകളോടൊപ്പം തുല്യമായി അവരുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ തെളിവുകള്\u200d കാണുന്നു. രണ്ടാമതായി, കെബിയിലെ ഓരോ മൂന്നിരട്ടി പങ്ക് പരിശോധിക്കാനുള്ള സ്വാഭാവം നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. എല്ലാ കൂട്ടത്ത To exemplify the potential applications of our study, we also present two strategies (by adding and removing KB triples) to mitigate gender biases in KB embeddings.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь (КБ) нь гендерийн тухай байдлыг харуулсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр алдартай талаар хоёр асуулт судалж байна: хэрхэн тооцоолж, КБ-ын эх үүсвэрийг хэрхэн олох вэ? Эхлээд, бид хүний бүлэг болон хүний бүлэг хоёр шинэ өрөөсгөл дүрслэлүүдийг хөгжүүлнэ. Тэдний үнэ цэнэтэй байдлын баталгаа бодит ертөнцийн шинжлэх ухааны мэдээллээс харьцуулж байдаг. Хоёрт, бид КБ-д гурав дахин нийт бүлгийн нөлөөлөлт хийх функцийг хэрэглэдэг. Бидний судалгааны потенциал хэрэглээ жишээлбэл бид КБ-ын хөндлөлд гендер ялгааг багасгаж, хоёр стратегийг (КБ-ын гурав дахин нэмж, устгаж) тайлбарлаж байна.', 'no': 'Kvitningsbasen (KB) er vist for å innehalda seks- forsikt. I denne papiret studerer vi to spørsmål om desse følgjande: korleis kvantifiserer dei, og korleis å spora opprinnelsen sine i KB? Spesielt, først, utviklar vi to novel bias-målingar for eit gruppe personeiningar og ein individuell personeining. Ved sammenligninga med verkeleg census data blir bevisert om deres gyldighet. For andre, bruker vi effektfunksjonen for å kontrollere bidragen til kvar trekant i KB til den generelle gruppeforsikta. For eksempel på dei potensielle programmene i studien vår, presenterer vi også to strategier (ved å leggja til og fjerna KB-trekantar) for å redusera seks-forvirkingar i KB-innbygging.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że osadzenia bazy wiedzy (KB) zawierają uprzedzenia płci. W artykule badamy dwa pytania dotyczące tych uprzedzeń: jak je ilościowo określić i jak śledzić ich pochodzenie w KB? W szczególności, najpierw opracowujemy dwa nowe mierniki stronniczości odpowiednio dla grupy podmiotów osobowych i indywidualnej jednostki osobowej. Dowody na ich ważność obserwuje się w porównaniu z rzeczywistymi danymi spisowymi. Po drugie, wykorzystujemy funkcję wpływu do sprawdzania wkładu każdego potrójnego w KB w ogólną grupę uprzedzeń. Aby przykładowo przedstawić potencjalne zastosowania naszego badania, przedstawiamy również dwie strategie (dodając i usuwając potrójniki KB) zmniejszające uprzedzenia płci w osadzeniach KB.', 'mt': 'Knowledge base (KB) embeddings have been shown to contain gender biases.  F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw żewġ mistoqsijiet dwar dawn il-preġudizzji: kif jikkwantifikawhom, u kif jittraċċaw l-oriġini tagħhom f’KB? Speċifikament, l-ewwel, niżviluppaw żewġ miżuri ġodda ta’ preġudizzju rispettivament għal grupp ta’ entitajiet ta’ persuna u entità ta’ persuna individwali. Evidenza tal-validità tagħhom hija osservata meta mqabbla mad-dejta taċ-ċensiment tad-dinja reali. It-tieni nett, aħna nużaw il-funzjoni ta’ influwenza biex ninspezzjonaw il-kontribut ta’ kull triplu f’KB għall-preġudizzju ġenerali tal-grupp. Biex nagħmlu eżempju tal-applikazzjonijiet potenzjali tal-istudju tagħna, qed nippreżentaw ukoll żewġ strateġiji (billi nżidu u neħħew it-tripli tal-KB) biex jittaffew il-preġudizzji bejn is-sessi fl-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-KB.', 'ro': 'S-a demonstrat că încorporările bazei de cunoștințe (KB) conțin părtiniri de gen. În această lucrare, studiem două întrebări referitoare la aceste prejudecăți: cum să le cuantificăm și cum să le urmărim originile în KB? Mai precis, în primul rând, dezvoltăm două noi măsuri de părtinire pentru un grup de entități persoane și, respectiv, pentru o entitate persoană individuală. Dovada validității acestora este observată prin comparație cu datele recensământului din lumea reală. În al doilea rând, folosim funcția de influență pentru a inspecta contribuția fiecărui triplu în KB la părtinirea generală a grupului. Pentru a exemplifica potențialele aplicații ale studiului nostru, prezentăm, de asemenea, două strategii (prin adăugarea și eliminarea triplelor KB) pentru a atenua prejudecățile de gen în încorporările KB.', 'si': 'Name මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් ගැන: කොහොමද ඔවුන්ව ගණනය කරන්නේ, ඒ වගේම කිබී ව විශේෂයෙන්, මුලින්ම, අපි විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200d ඔවුන්ගේ ශක්තිමත්වය ගැන සාක්ෂිත සාක්ෂිත විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ සැන්සුම්  දෙවෙනි විදියටම, අපි ප්\u200dරභාව පාවිච්චි කරනවා KB වල හැම තුන්පරයෙක්ම සම්පූර්ණ කණ්ඩායම් ප්\u200dරභාවි අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපි KB ත්\u200dරිප්\u200dරශ්නයක් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරන්න සහ අතිරික්ෂණය කරනවා (KB ත්\u200dරිප්පල් එක', 'sr': 'Pokazano je da se ugražavanje znanja (KB) sadrže spolne predrasude. U ovom papiru, proučavamo dva pitanja o ovim predrasudama: kako da ih kvantificiramo i kako da pratimo njihov porekl u KB-u? Posebno, prvo, razvijamo dve nove predrasude za grupu osobnih entiteta i pojedinačnu osobu. Dokazi o njihovoj validnosti posmatraju se usporedbom sa podacima o popisu stvarnog svijeta. Drugo, koristimo funkciju utjecaja da provjerimo doprinos svakog trostrukog u KB-u na ukupnu predrasude grupe. Da bi primjerili potencijalne primjene našeg studija, takođe predstavljamo dve strategije (dodajući i uklanjajući trojke KB-a) kako bi smanjili spolne predrasude u KB-u.', 'so': "Meelaha aqoonta (KB) waxaa lagu muujiyey inay ku jirto habka jinsiga. Warqadan waxaan ka baranaynaa laba su'aalood oo ku saabsan tababaradan: sidee u qiyaasaynaa, sidee ayaannu ugu sawiraynaa asalkiisa KB? Si gaar ah marka ugu horeysa, waxaan horumarinaa laba qof oo qofka ah iyo qof gaar ah loo sameeyo qaab ahaan loo sameeyo qof. caddeynta shaqeyntooda waxaa loola jeedaa tusaale ahaan macluumaadka xisaabinta ee caalamka ah. Second, waxaynu isticmaalnaa shaqada saameyn ku leh si aan u xaqiijinno bixinta saddex jeer ee KB-ka ugu dhexeeya tababarka kooxda oo dhan. Tusaale ahaan codsiyada waxbarashada ee suurtagalka ah, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa laba qoraal (ku daro iyo dhaqaajinta KB tribaalooyinka) si ay u dhaqdhaqaajinno tababarka jinsiga ee KB.", 'sv': 'Inbäddningar av kunskapsbas (KB) har visat sig innehålla könsfördomar. I denna uppsats studerar vi två frågor kring dessa fördomar: hur man kvantifierar dem, och hur man spårar deras ursprung i KB? För det första utvecklar vi två nya bias-mått för en grupp personenheter respektive en enskild personenhet. Bevis på deras giltighet observeras genom jämförelse med verkliga folkräkningsuppgifter. För det andra använder vi inflytningsfunktionen för att inspektera bidraget från varje trippel i KB till den övergripande gruppbiasen. För att exemplifiera de potentiella tillämpningarna i vår studie presenterar vi också två strategier (genom att lägga till och ta bort KB-tredubblingar) för att mildra könsfördomar i KB-inbäddningar.', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை (KB) உள்ளீடுகள் பெண்களின் குழப்பங்களை கொண்டிருக்க காட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது. In this paper, we study two questions regarding these biases: how to quantify them, and how to trace their origins in KB?  குறிப்பிட்டு, முதலில், நாம் தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட்ட பொருளுக்கும் ஒரு குழுவுக்கும் ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட தனிப்பட்ட பொருளுக் உண்மையான உலக உணர்வு தரவை ஒப்பிட்டு அவர்களுடைய செல்லுபடியான தெளிவாக்கம் பார்க்கப்படுகிறது. இரண்டாவது, நாம் பாக்கியமுள்ள செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தி ஒவ்வொரு மூன்று முறை கேபியிலுள்ள பங்கு பரிசோதிக்க பயன்படுத் எங்கள் படிக்கையின் சாத்தியமான பயன்பாடுகளை எடுத்துகாட்டுவதற்கு, நாங்கள் கேபி முன்னோட்டங்களை சேர்த்து நீக்குவதற்காக இரண்டு திட்டங்களைக்', 'ur': 'علم base (KB) ایمبڈینگ جنس کی مخالفت میں شامل ہونے کے لئے دکھائے گئے ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم دو سؤال پڑھتے ہیں ان کی منظوروں کے بارے میں: ان کو کس طرح تعداد کرنا، اور ان کی اصلی کوب میں کس طرح پیدا کرنا؟ مخصوصاً پہلے، ہم نے ایک گروپ آدمی اور ایک شخص entity کے لئے دو نئی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر تولید کی. ان کی طاقت کی نشانیاں حقیقی دنیاوی سنسس ڈیٹے کے مقابلہ سے دیکھی جاتی ہیں. دوسرا، ہم نے کب میں ہر تین تین بار کے حصہ کی تحقیق کرنے کے لئے تاثیر فنقش کا استعمال کیا ہے۔ ہمارے مطالعہ کے قابل کاروبار کی مثال کے لئے، ہم نے بھی دو استراتژی (KB تین تین تین تین تین تین جمع کرنے اور ہٹانے کے ذریعہ) کو KB انڈینگ میں جنس کی بغیر کم کرنے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda biz bu tabiiy haqida ikkita savol o'rganamiz: ularni qanday tasdiqlash mumkin, qanday KB'da aslida qanday qidirish mumkin? Birinchisi, biz bir guruh shaxsiy narsalar va bir oddiy shaxsiy tizim uchun ikkita roman foydalanuvchilarni taqdim qilamiz. Ularning haqiqiqiyligi haqiqiqiyligini dunyodagi xabar maʼlumotga kamaytirish mumkin. Second, we use the influence function to inspect the contribution of each triple in KB to the overall group bias.  Masalan, biz o'qituvchimizning eng muhimi dasturlarimiz uchun, biz ko'proq KB ta'minlovchilarini qoʻshish va olib tashlash uchun ikkita strategiyalarni ko'rsamiz.", 'vi': 'Đã có khả năng nhận dạng dựa trên khả năng phân biệt giới tính. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu hai câu hỏi về các giả thuyết này: làm thế nào để định lượng chúng, và làm thế nào để lần theo nguồn gốc của chúng tại KB? Cụ thể, đầu tiên, chúng tôi phát triển hai dự án thiên vị mới nhất cho một nhóm người và một cơ thể cá nhân. Chứng cứ giá trị của chúng được quan sát bằng so sánh với dữ liệu thống kê thế giới thực. Thứ hai, chúng tôi dùng chức năng ảnh hưởng để kiểm tra sự đóng góp của mỗi tế bào trong KB cho thành kiến của nhóm. Để ví dụ các ứng dụng tiềm năng trong nghiên cứu của chúng tôi, chúng tôi cũng đưa ra hai chiến lược (bằng cách thêm và gỡ bỏ KB triples) để giảm quy mô giới tính trong sự cài ghép của KB.', 'da': 'Indlejringer af vidensbase (KB) har vist sig at indeholde kønsfordomme. I denne artikel undersøger vi to spørgsmål vedrørende disse fordomme: hvordan man kvantificerer dem, og hvordan man sporer deres oprindelse i KB? Specielt udvikler vi for det første to nye bias målinger for henholdsvis en gruppe af personenheder og en individuel personenhed. Beviser for deres gyldighed observeres ved sammenligning med data fra folketællingerne i den virkelige verden. For det andet bruger vi indflydelsesfunktionen til at inspicere bidraget fra hver tredobbelt i KB til den samlede gruppe bias. For at eksemplificere de potentielle anvendelser af vores undersøgelse præsenterer vi også to strategier (ved at tilføje og fjerne KB tripler) for at afbøde kønsfordomme i KB embeddings.', 'nl': 'Er is aangetoond dat insluitingen in de kennisbank (KB) gender biases bevatten. In dit artikel bestuderen we twee vragen over deze vooroordelen: hoe kwantificeren we ze en hoe traceren we hun oorsprong in KB? Specifiek, eerst ontwikkelen we twee nieuwe bias metingen respectievelijk voor een groep van personen entiteiten en een individuele persoon entiteit. Bewijs van hun geldigheid wordt waargenomen door vergelijking met echte volkstellingsgegevens. Ten tweede gebruiken we de invloed functie om de bijdrage van elke triple in KB aan de algemene groepsbias te inspecteren. Om de mogelijke toepassingen van ons onderzoek te illustreren, presenteren we ook twee strategieën (door KB-triples toe te voegen en te verwijderen) om gender biases in KB-embeddings te verminderen.', 'bg': 'Доказано е, че вградените в базата данни от знания (КБ) съдържат пристрастия към пола. В тази статия изследваме два въпроса относно тези пристрастия: как да ги определим количествено и как да проследим произхода им в КБ? По-конкретно, първо, разработваме две нови мерки за пристрастяване съответно за група от личностни субекти и индивидуално личностно образувание. Доказателства за тяхната валидност се наблюдават в сравнение с данните от преброяването в реалния свят. Второ, използваме функцията влияние, за да проверим приноса на всяка тройка в КБ за цялостното групово отклонение. За да дадем пример на потенциалните приложения на нашето проучване, ние също така представяме две стратегии (чрез добавяне и премахване на тройки на КБ) за смекчаване на половите пристрастия в вграждането на КБ.', 'hr': 'Pokazane su ugrađenje znanstvene baze (KB) koje sadrže spolne predrasude. U ovom papiru, proučavamo dvije pitanja o ovim predrasudama: kako ih kvantificirati i kako pratiti njihov porijekl u KB-u? Posebno, prvo, razvijamo dvije nove mjere predrasude za skupinu osobnih subjekta i osobnog subjekta. Dokazi o njihovoj validnosti primjećuju se usporedbom s podacima o popisu stvarnog svijeta. Drugo, koristimo funkciju utjecaja kako bi provjerili doprinos svakog trostrukog u KB-u na ukupnu predrasude grupe. Za primjer potencijalnih primjena našeg ispitivanja, također predstavljamo dvije strategije (dodajući i uklanjajući trostruke KB-e) kako bi smanjili spolne predrasude u KB-u.', 'de': 'Einbettungen in Wissensbanken (KB) enthalten nachweislich geschlechtsspezifische Verzerrungen. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir zwei Fragen zu diesen Verzerrungen: Wie können sie quantifiziert werden und wie können sie in KB zurückgeführt werden? Konkret entwickeln wir zunächst zwei neuartige Biasmaßnahmen für eine Gruppe von Personenentitäten bzw. eine individuelle Personenentität. Der Nachweis ihrer Gültigkeit wird durch Vergleich mit realen Zensusdaten beobachtet. Zweitens verwenden wir die Einflussfunktion, um den Beitrag jedes Tripels in KB zum Gesamtgruppenbias zu untersuchen. Um die Anwendungsmöglichkeiten unserer Studie zu veranschaulichen, stellen wir außerdem zwei Strategien vor (durch Hinzufügen und Entfernen von KB-Tripeln), um geschlechtsspezifische Verzerrungen in KB-Einbettungen zu verringern.', 'id': 'Pengetahuan dasar pengetahuan (KB) telah ditunjukkan mengandung biases jenis. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari dua pertanyaan mengenai biases ini: bagaimana mengurangi mereka, dan bagaimana melacak asalnya dalam KB? Secara spesifik, pertama-tama, kita mengembangkan dua tindakan bias novel secara respektif untuk kelompok entitas orang dan entitas individu orang. Bukti kebenaran mereka diperhatikan dengan perbandingan dengan data census dunia nyata. Kedua, kita menggunakan fungsi pengaruh untuk memeriksa kontribusi setiap tiga kali dalam KB untuk keseluruhan bias kelompok. Untuk memberikan contoh pada aplikasi potensial dari studi kami, kami juga mempersembahkan dua strategi (dengan menambah dan menghapus KB tiga kali) untuk mengurangi bias jenis dalam embedding KB.', 'ko': 'Knowledgebase(KB) 내장은 성별 편견을 포함하고 있음을 증명합니다.본고에서 우리는 이러한 편견과 관련된 두 가지 문제를 연구했다. 어떻게 이런 편견을 계량화하고 KB로 그들의 기원을 추적하는가?구체적으로 말하자면, 우선 우리는 각각 한 그룹의 개인 실체와 한 그룹의 개인 실체를 위해 두 가지 새로운 편차 도량을 개발했다.현실 세계 인구센서스 데이터와 비교해 그 유효성을 관찰할 수 있는 증거가 있다.그런 다음 영향 함수를 사용하여 각 3원 그룹(KB 단위)이 전체 그룹 편차에 기여하는지 확인합니다.예를 들어 우리 연구의 잠재적인 응용을 설명하기 위해 우리는 두 가지 전략(지식 라이브러리 3원조 추가와 삭제)을 제시하여 지식 라이브러리에 박힌 성별 편견을 완화시켰다.', 'fa': 'پایگاه دانش (KB) را نشان داده می\u200cشود که شامل کنایه\u200cهای جنسی باشد. در این کاغذ، ما دو سوال درباره این پیشرفت مطالعه می کنیم: چگونه تعداد آنها را تعداد کنیم، و چگونه تعداد اصلی آنها را در کیب پیدا کنیم؟ مخصوصاً اول، ما دو مرحله\u200cای روانی را برای گروهی از اجتماعات شخصی و یک اجتماعی شخصی توسعه می\u200cدهیم. مدرک ارزش آنها با مقایسه با داده\u200cهای عدد جهانی واقعی مشاهده می\u200cشود. دوم، ما از فعالیت تأثیر استفاده می کنیم تا بررسی کردن شرکت هر سه بار در کیب به همۀ تأثیر گروه. برای مثال کاربردهای پتانسیل تحقیقات ما، دو استراتژی (با اضافه کردن و حذف سه کیلومتر کیلومتر کیلومتر) را برای تخفیف سابق جنسی در استراتژی\u200cهای کیلومتر نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Mpango wa maarifa (KB) umeonyesha kuwepo na upendeleo wa kijinsia. Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma maswali mawili kuhusiana na upendeleo huu: jinsi ya kuwakadiria, na jinsi ya kutafuta asili zao kwenye KB? Kwa hakika, kwanza, tunaendelea hatua mbili za riwaya za upendeleo kwa ajili ya makundi ya watu na entity binafsi. Evidence of their validity is observed by comparison with real-world census data.  Pili, tunatumia kazi ya ushawishi ili kutazama mchango wa kila mara tatu KB kwa upendeleo wa kikundi jumla. Kwa mfano wa matumizi ya utafiti wetu, pia tunaweka mbinu mbili (kwa kuongeza na kuondoa watatu wa KB) ili kupunguza upendeleo wa kijinsia katika maeneo ya KB.', 'tr': "Bilgi paýsy (KB) cinsiýaly faýllary eklemek üçin görkezildi. Bu kağıt içinde, bu biaslar hakkında iki sorag öwrenip, onları nasıl ölçüde ve KB'deki tarzdaklarını nasıl izlemelidir? Adatça, ilkinji gezek, bir adam we bir adam zady üçin iki täze ruhsat öngörüşi döredýäris. Evidence of their validity is observed by comparison with real-world census data. Ikinjisi, KB-iň her üç sany topar durumynyň ýerini barlamak üçin täsirli fonksiýany ulanýarys. Öwrenmegimiziň potensial uygulamalaryny üýtgetmek üçin, KB-iň üýtgeşmelerini azaltmak üçin iki strateji (kB üçin eklemek we çykarmak üçin) belleýäris.", 'sq': "Ndërtesat e bazës së njohurive (KB) janë treguar që përmbajnë paragjykime gjinore. Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë dy pyetje lidhur me këto paragjykime: si t'i quantifikojmë ato dhe si të gjurmojmë origjinat e tyre në KB? Veçan ërisht, së pari, ne zhvillojmë dy masa të paragjykimit respektivisht për një grup njësive personash dhe një njësi individuale personash. Evidence of their validity is observed by comparison with real-world census data.  Së dyti, ne përdorim funksionin e ndikimit për të inspektuar kontributin e çdo trefishi në KB në paragjykimin e përgjithshëm të grupit. Për të shembulluar aplikimet potenciale të studimit tonë, ne paraqesim gjithashtu dy strategji (duke shtuar dhe hequr tre KB-të) për të lehtësuar paragjykimet gjinore në përfshirjet e KB-së.", 'af': "Kennis basis (Kb) inbêdings het gewys na bevat seuns biases. In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons twee vrae aangaande hierdie voorskrifte: hoe om hulle te quantifiseer, en hoe om hulle oorskrifte in Kb te soek? Spesifieke, eerste, ons ontwikkel twee novele bias-merke respektief vir 'n groep persoonlike entiteite en 'n individuele persoonlike entiteit. Die getuienisse van hulle geldigheid word aangesien deur vergelyking met reël-wêreldscensus data. Tweede, ons gebruik die influens funksie om die bydraai van elke drieflik in Kb te inspekteer na die hele groep bias. Om die potensiele toepassings van ons studie te voorbeeld, stel ons ook twee strategies (deur Kb tripels byvoeg en verwyder) om seuns biases in Kb inbettings te verminder.", 'am': 'የእውቀት መቀመጫዎች (KB) የሴሰኝነት ጥያቄዎችን ለመውሰድ ተገልጦአል፡፡ In this paper, we study two questions regarding these biases: how to quantify them, and how to trace their origins in KB?  በተለይም፣ በመጀመሪያ፣ ሁለት የዘላለም የአንድ ሰው አካላት እና አንድ ሰው አካላት እያንዳንዱ የደረጃ ተቃውሞ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የእውነታቸውን ማስረጃ እውነተኛ የዓለም ሰንሱስ ዳታ በማስተካከል ነው፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ የጥያቄውን ሥራ በኪB ውስጥ የሦስት ደጋፊውን ለመፍጠር እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ለመምሳሌ የፍላጎታችንን ፕሮግራሞች ለመግለጽ፣ በኪB ውስጥ የሴቶችን ጉዳዮች ለመጨመር እና ለመግለጥ ሁለት strategieን እናቀርባለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ գիտելիքի հիմքի (ԿԲ) ներդրումները պարունակում են գենդերային կողմնականություններ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու հարց այս կողմնականությունների վերաբերյալ. ինչպե՞ս չափեցնել դրանք և ինչպես հետևել նրանց ծագումը ԿԲ-ում: Մասնավորապես, առաջին հերթին, մենք զարգանում ենք երկու նոր կողմնակի չափումներ անձնական էակների խմբի և անձնական էակի համար: Նրանց ճշգրիտության ապացույցները դիտարկվում են համեմատելով իրական աշխարհի հաշվարկման տվյալները: Երկրորդ, մենք օգտագործում ենք ազդեցության ֆունկցիան, որպեսզի ստուգենք ԿԲ-ի յուրաքանչյուր երեք անգամ ներդրումը խմբի ընդհանուր կողմնականության վրա: Մեր ուսումնասիրության պոտենցիալ կիրառումները օրինակելու համար մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք երկու ռազմավարություններ (Ք.Բ-ի եռավոր անգամ ավելացնելով և հեռացնելով դրանք), որպեսզի նվազեցնենք գենդերային կողմնականու', 'az': 'Bilim bazı (KB) inşalları cins tərzlərini sadəcə saxlamaq üçün göstərildi. Bu kağızda, biz bu tədbirlər haqqında iki sual öyrənirik: onları necə kvantifikat edə bilər və bunların mənbələrini KB-dən necə izləyəcəyik? Özellikle, ilk dəfə, bir grup kişilər və bir kişilik entitəti üçün iki yeni təsiri ölçülərini təhsil edirik. Onların qiymətlərinin kanıtları həqiqət dünya census veriləri ilə qarşılaşdırılır. İkincisi, bütün qrup təsirlərinə üç dəfə kömək göstərmək üçün təsiri funksiyasını istifadə edirik. Öyrəndiyimiz mümkün uyğulamalarımızı örnək etmək üçün, KB-də cins biases azaltmaq üçün iki strateji də göstəririk.', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের বেস (কেবি) প্রবেশ করার প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে লিঙ্গের বৈষম্য রয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই প্রতিযোগিতা সম্পর্কে দুটি প্রশ্ন পড়ি: কিভাবে তাদের পরিমাণ নির্ধারণ করা যায়, কিভাবে কেবিতে তাদের বিশেষ করে, প্রথমত, আমরা ব্যক্তিগত প্রতিষ্ঠান এবং ব্যক্তিগত ব্যক্তিগত প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য দুটি নোভাল বিরোধী পদক্ষেপ উন্ন বাস্তব বিশ্বের সেন্সরসের তথ্যের তুলনায় তাদের বৈধতার প্রমাণ দেখা যাচ্ছে। দ্বিতীয়, আমরা প্রভাব ফাংশন ব্যবহার করি কেবিতে প্রত্যেক ত্রিবিগুলোর অবদান পরীক্ষা করার জন্য। আমাদের গবেষণার সম্ভাব্য অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের উদাহরণের জন্য আমরা কেবি বিভিন্ন লিঙ্গের প্রতিযোগিতা কমিয়ে দিতে দুটি কৌশল উপস্থাপন করি (কেবি ত্র', 'bs': 'Pokazano je da se integracija znanja (KB) sadrže spolne predrasude. U ovom papiru, proučavamo dva pitanja o ovim predrasudama: kako ih kvantificirati i kako pratiti njihov porijekl u KB-u? Posebno, prvo, razvijamo dvije nove predrasude za grupu osobnih entiteta i pojedinačnu osobu. Dokazi o njihovoj validnosti posmatraju se usporedbom s podacima o popisu stvarnog svijeta. Drugo, koristimo funkciju utjecaja da provjerimo doprinos svakog trostrukog u KB-u na ukupnu predrasude grupe. Za primjer potencijalnih primjena našeg studija, također predstavljamo dvije strategije (dodajući i uklanjajući trostruke KB-e) kako bi smanjili spolne predrasude u KB-u.', 'ca': "S'ha demostrat que les incorporacions de la base de coneixements (KB) contenen biases de gènere. En aquest article estudiem dues preguntes sobre aquestes tendències: com quantificar-les i com rastrear els seus orígens a KB? Concretament, primer, desenvolupem dues noves mesures de bias respectivament per a un grup d'entitats persones i una entitat individual. La prova de la seva validez es veu comparant amb les dades del cens del món real. Segon, utilitzem la funció d'influència per inspeccionar la contribució de cada triple de KB a la tendència general del grup. Per exemplificar les aplicacions potencials del nostre estudi, també presentem dues estratègies (afegint i eliminant els triples de KB) per mitigar les tendències de gènere en les integracions de KB.", 'cs': 'Bylo prokázáno, že vložení znalostní báze (KB) obsahují genderové zaujatosti. V tomto článku studujeme dvě otázky týkající se těchto předsudků: jak je kvantifikovat a jak sledovat jejich původ v KB? Konkrétně nejprve vyvíjíme dvě nové měřítka biasu pro skupinu osobních entit a jednotlivou osobní entitu. Důkazy o jejich platnosti jsou sledovány porovnáním s reálnými sčítacími daty. Za druhé používáme funkci vlivu ke zkoumání přínosu každého trojitého v KB na celkové skupinové biasy. Pro ukázku potenciálních aplikací naší studie představujeme také dvě strategie (přidáním a odstraněním trojnásobek KB) ke zmírnění genderových zaujatostí v vložení KB.', 'et': 'On tõestatud, et teadmistebaasi (KB) põimimised sisaldavad soolisi eelarvamusi. Käesolevas töös uurime kahte küsimust nende eelarvamuste kohta: kuidas neid kvantifitseerida ja kuidas jälgida nende päritolu KB-s? Esmalt töötame välja kaks uut erapooletusmeetrit vastavalt isiklike üksuste rühmale ja üksikisiku üksusele. Nende kehtivust tõendatakse võrreldes reaalmaailma loendusandmetega. Teiseks kasutame mõjufunktsiooni, et kontrollida iga kolmekordse KB panust üldisesse rühma kallakusse. Et näidata meie uuringu võimalikke rakendusi, esitame ka kaks strateegiat (lisades ja eemaldades KB kolmekordsed), et leevendada soolisi eelarvamusi KB manustamises.', 'fi': 'Knowledge Base (KB) upotusten on osoitettu sisältävän sukupuolivääristymiä. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme kahta kysymystä näistä ennakkoluuloista: miten ne kvantifioidaan ja miten niiden alkuperä voidaan jäljittää KB:ssä? Ensinnäkin kehitämme kaksi uutta bias-mittaria henkilökokonaisuuksien ryhmälle ja yksittäiselle henkilökokonaisuudelle. Todisteita niiden pätevyydestä havaitaan vertaamalla reaalimaailman väestölaskentatietoja. Toiseksi, käytämme vaikutusfunktiota tarkastaaksemme jokaisen kolminkertaisen KB:n osuuden kokonaisryhmäbiakseen. Esimerkkinä tutkimuksemme mahdollisista sovelluksista esittelemme myös kaksi strategiaa (lisäämällä ja poistamalla tietokantojen kolminkertaisia tietokantoja), joilla lievennetään sukupuolivääristymiä tietokantojen upottamisessa.', 'jv': "Punika dipunangguna punika (MB) sing wis ngerasakno kanggo nyumbang panjenengan bias Nang mapun iki, kéné milih durung cejane pancen karo biasane iki: piye isakno nggawe barang kelas, lan kelas mripan sisangan tanggal sampek kang K ? Awak dhéwé, tualke, kita nglanggar kuwi tindahan durung lan ijolan karo paket kesempatan karo sampeyan karo perbudhakan wong. D'dokumen of their valid ness is underlined by contrast with true-world census data. wis segondi, kita ngubah wong pengguna nggo nyokake pawartos ning saben telas nang K lan mulai nggo bias karo nggo kelas. Mbok ngewehke aplikasi sing dipoleh kanggo ujian awak dhéwé, kita mulai 2 (nambah nambah lan nyimpen kB telu) kanggo nyengkuyung bias-bias kanggo nyengkuyung kanggo nyengkuyung kanggo nyengkuyung kB.", 'he': 'הוראה שהתוספות של בסיס הידע (KB) מכילות תמונות מין. בעיתון הזה, אנו לומדים שתי שאלות בנוגע לחלוטין אלה: איך לקוונטיב אותם, ואיך לאתר את מקורם בקי.בי.? במיוחד, קודם כל, אנחנו מפתחים שני אמצעים חדשים בהתאם לקבוצה של ישויות אישיות ואישות אישית. Evidence of their validity is observed by comparison with real-world census data.  שנית, אנו משתמשים בתפקיד השפעה כדי לבדוק את התרומה של כל שלישי בקי.בי. לחלוטין קבוצתי כללי. כדי להדגים את היישומים הפוטנציאליים של המחקר שלנו, אנחנו גם מציגים שני אסטרטגיות (על ידי להוסיף ולהסיר את השלישי KB) כדי להקל את ההתמחות מיני בתכניות KB.', 'ha': "An nuna cikin salon da aka sani (KB) don a ƙunsa da surori na jini. Ga wannan takardan, Munã karatun su suna tambayi biyu masu husũn wannan tabar: yadda za a iya ƙayyade su, kuma yadda za mu iya sakar ƙarorinsu a KB? Kayyai, a farkon, muna utoan takwizar biyu na noveli da haske wa jama'a-jama'a ko jama'a guda. @ info: whatsthis Dukkan, za mu yi amfani da aikin muhimmanci zuwa ko ko wani rabo na KB zuwa ga jama'a guda. To, dõmin misali masu shiryoyin ayukan mutane da ke cikin karatunmu, sai mu zo da takwai biyu (da za'a ƙara da kwanan kwanan KB) dõmin su cire saurin mutane a cikin KB.", 'sk': 'Dokazano je, da vključitve baze znanja (KB) vsebujejo pristranskost med spoloma. V prispevku preučujemo dve vprašanji v zvezi s temi pristranskostmi: kako jih kvantificirati in kako slediti njihovim izvorom v KB? Natančneje, prvič, razvijamo dva nova merila pristranskosti oziroma za skupino osebnih entitet oziroma posamezno osebno entiteto. Dokazi o njihovi veljavnosti se opazujejo s primerjavo s podatki popisa realnega sveta. Drugič, uporabljamo funkcijo vpliva za pregled prispevka vsake trojke v KB k celotni skupinski pristranskosti. Za primer potencialnih aplikacij naše študije predstavljamo tudi dve strategiji (z dodajanjem in odstranjevanjem trojk KB) za ublažitev pristranskih spolov v vdelavah KB.', 'bo': 'ཚན་རིགས་གཞི་རྟེན(KB)སྒྲིག་འཇུག་ནི་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་འདྲ་བ་ཡོད་པ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཕྲི་ཚིག་གནད་དོན་དག་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་དང་པོ་ནས་ང་ཚོས་མི་དང་མི་རྣམས་གཅིག་པའི་ཚོ་ཁག་གི་ཆ་ཁག་ལ་མཐུན་གྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་བྱེད། འདི་ཚོའི་རིན་ཐང་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྟོགས་བཤད་ནི་དངོས་ཡོད་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་འབྱུང་བ་བསྟུན་ཡོད། གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་དབར་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྩིས་ཐོག་རེ་རེ་རེའི་ནང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གསུམ་སྟོན་པར ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་རྩལ་ཡོད་པའི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པར་དཔེ་གཏོང་དགོས་ང་ཚོས་KB སྡོད་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གནད'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'علم اللغة التاريخي الحسابي وتنوع اللغة في {جنوب} جنوب {أ} سيا', 'es': 'Lingüística histórica computacional y diversidad lingüística en {S} outh {A} asia', 'pt': 'Linguística Histórica Computacional e Diversidade Linguística na {S}outh {A}sia', 'fr': 'Linguistique historique computationnelle et diversité linguistique en {S} sud {A} Asie', 'ja': '{S} outh {A} siaの計算歴史言語学と言語の多様性', 'zh': '计史语言学语多样性在{S}outh {A}sia', 'hi': 'कम्प्यूटेशनल ऐतिहासिक भाषाविज्ञान और {S}outh {A}sia में भाषा विविधता', 'ru': 'Вычислительная историческая лингвистика и языковое разнообразие в {S}outh {A}sia', 'ga': 'Teangeolaíocht Ríomhaireachtúil Stairiúil agus Éagsúlacht Teanga sa {S}amuigh {A}sia', 'ka': 'კომპუტაციონალური ისტორიული ლინგისტიკა და ენის განსხვავება {S} outh {A} sia', 'el': 'Υπολογιστική Ιστορική Γλωσσολογία και Γλωσσική Ποικιλομορφία στην {Σ}έξω {Α}σία', 'hu': 'Számítástörténeti nyelvtudomány és nyelvi sokféleség {S}out {A}sia', 'it': 'Linguistica storica computazionale e diversità linguistica in {S}out {A}sia', 'lt': 'Kompiuterinė istorinė kalba ir kalbų įvairovė {S}outh {A}sia', 'mk': 'Компутационална историска јазика и јазична различност во {S}outh {A}sia', 'kk': 'Компьютерлік тарихлық лингвистик және тіл айырмашылығы {S}outh {A} sia', 'ms': 'Computational Historical Linguistics and Language Diversity in {S}outh {A}sia', 'ml': '{S} പുറത്തു് കണക്കാക്കുന്ന ചരിത്രത്തിലെ ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്കും ഭാഷ വ്യത്യാസവും', 'mt': 'Lingwistika Storika tal-Komputazzjoni u Diversità Lingwistika f’{S}outh {A}sia', 'mn': 'Компьютерийн түүхийн хэл болон хэл олон төрлийн талаар {S}outh {A}sia -д', 'pl': 'Informacyjna językowość historyczna i różnorodność językowa w {S}outh {A}sia', 'ro': 'Lingvistica istorică computaţională şi diversitatea limbilor în {S}out {A}sia', 'no': 'Computational Historical Linguistics and Language Diversity in {S}outh {A}sia', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaadka la xiriira ee taariikhda iyo luuqada kala duduwan {S} outh {A}sia', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණාත්මක භාෂාත්මක සහ භාෂාත්මක විවේදනය {S}out {A} වලින්', 'sv': 'Beräkningshistorisk lingvistik och språkmångfald i {S}ut {A}sia', 'sr': 'Kompjuterska istorijska lingwistika i raznolikost jezika u {S}outh {A}sia', 'ur': '{S}outh {A} sia میں کمپیوٹریشن تاریخی لینگیستیک اور زبان مختلف', 'ta': 'வரலாற்று நிரல் மற்றும் மொழி வித்தியாசம் {S} outh {A} sia', 'vi': 'Tính toán ngôn ngữ học và ngôn ngữ khác biệt', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Изчислителна историческа лингвистика и езиково многообразие в {С}аутх {А}сия', 'hr': 'Računalna istorijska lingwistika i raznolikost jezika u {S}outh {A}sia', 'da': 'Computational Historisk Lingvistik og Sprogmangfoldighed i {S}out {A}sia', 'nl': 'Computational Historical Linguistics and Language Diversity in {S}outh {A}sia', 'de': 'Computerhistorische Linguistik und Sprachenvielfalt in {S}outh {A}sia', 'ko': '계산 역사 언어학과 남아시아 언어의 다양성', 'id': 'Bahasa Sejarah Komputasi dan Perbedaan Bahasa dalam {S}outh {A}sia', 'fa': 'زبان\u200cهای تاریخی کامپیوتری و مختلف زبان در {S}outh {A}sia', 'af': 'Computational Historical Linguistics and Language Diversity in {S}outh {A}sia', 'sw': 'Uth {A} sia', 'tr': '{S}outh {A}siýada Bilgisayar Taryhy Linkler we Diller Çeşitmeleri', 'sq': 'Lingjistika historike kompjuterike dhe ndryshimi gjuhësor në {S}outh {A}sia', 'am': 'ውጭ', 'hy': '{S}', 'az': '{S}outh {A}sia içində hesaplayan Tarihi Dil Çeşitməsi və Dil Çeşitməsi', 'bn': '{A} বাইরে গণনামূলক ঐতিহাসিক লিঙ্গিস্টিক এবং ভাষা বিভাগ', 'bs': 'Kompjuterska istorijska lingwistika i raznolikost jezika u {S}outh {A}sia', 'cs': 'Výpočetní historická lingvistika a jazyková diverzita v {S}outh {A}sia', 'ca': 'Llinguística històrica computacional i diversitat de llenguatge en {S}outh {A}sia', 'et': 'Arvutuslik ajalooline lingvistika ja keeleline mitmekesisus {S}outh {A}sia', 'fi': 'Laskennallinen historiallinen kielitiede ja kielten monimuotoisuus {S}outh {A}siassa', 'jv': 'Distribution List Linguistis and Language divisions in {S}out of {A}', 'he': 'שפת היסטורית מחשבתית ומגוון שפת ב {S}outh {A}sia', 'sk': 'Računalniška zgodovinska jezikovna znanost in jezikovna raznolikost v {S}outh {A}sia', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Computational Historical Linguistics and Language Diversity in {S}outh {A}sia'}
{'en': 'CLIP has shown a remarkable zero-shot capability on a wide range of vision tasks. Previously, CLIP is only regarded as a powerful visual encoder. However, after being pre-trained by language supervision from a large amount of image-caption pairs, CLIP itself should also have acquired some few-shot abilities for vision-language tasks. In this work, we empirically show that CLIP can be a strong vision-language few-shot learner by leveraging the power of language. We first evaluate CLIP’s zero-shot performance on a typical visual question answering task and demonstrate a zero-shot cross-modality transfer capability of CLIP on the visual entailment task. Then we propose a parameter-efficient fine-tuning strategy to boost the few-shot performance on the vqa task. We achieve competitive zero/few-shot results on the visual question answering and visual entailment tasks without introducing any additional pre-training procedure.', 'ar': 'تعد جنوب آسيا موطنًا لعدد كبير من اللغات ، يفتقر الكثير منها بشدة إلى الوصول إلى تقنيات اللغة الجديدة. ينتج عن هذا التنوع اللغوي أيضًا بيئة بحثية مواتية لدراسة علم اللغة المقارن والاتصال والتاريخ - المجالات التي تتطلب جمع بيانات واسعة من العديد من اللغات. ندعي أن تشتت البيانات (بدلاً من ندرة) هو العقبة الأساسية في تطوير تكنولوجيا اللغة في جنوب آسيا ، ونقترح أن دراسة تاريخ اللغة تتماشى بشكل فريد مع التغلب على هذه العقبة. نستعرض التطورات الأخيرة في وعلى تقاطع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية لجنوب آسيا واللغويات المقارنة التاريخية ، ونصف جهودنا الحالية وجهود الآخرين في هذا المجال. نقدم أيضًا استراتيجيات جديدة لكسر حاجز البيانات.', 'fr': "L'Asie du Sud abrite une pléthore de langues, dont beaucoup n'ont pas accès aux nouvelles technologies linguistiques. Cette diversité linguistique crée également un environnement de recherche propice à l'étude de la linguistique comparée, de contact et historique, domaines qui nécessitent la collecte de données exhaustives provenant de nombreuses langues. Nous affirmons que la dispersion des données (plutôt que leur rareté) est le principal obstacle au développement de la technologie linguistique en Asie du Sud, et nous suggérons que l'étude de l'histoire des langues est parfaitement alignée sur le dépassement de cet obstacle. Nous passons en revue les développements récents dans et à l'intersection de la PNL en Asie du Sud et de la linguistique historico-comparée, en décrivant nos efforts actuels et ceux des autres dans ce domaine. Nous proposons également de nouvelles stratégies pour surmonter la barrière des données.", 'es': 'El sur de Asia alberga una gran cantidad de idiomas, muchos de los cuales carecen gravemente de acceso a las nuevas tecnologías lingüísticas. Esta diversidad lingüística también da como resultado un entorno de investigación propicio para el estudio de la lingüística comparativa, de contacto e histórica, campos que requieren la recopilación de datos extensos de muchos idiomas. Afirmamos que la dispersión de datos (más que la escasez) es el principal obstáculo en el desarrollo de la tecnología lingüística del sur de Asia, y sugerimos que el estudio de la historia del lenguaje está alineado de manera única con la superación de este obstáculo. Revisamos los desarrollos recientes en y en la intersección de la PNL del sur de Asia y la lingüística histórico-comparada, describiendo nuestros esfuerzos actuales y los de otros en esta área. También ofrecemos nuevas estrategias para superar la barrera de los datos.', 'pt': 'O sul da Ásia abriga uma infinidade de idiomas, muitos dos quais carecem severamente de acesso a novas tecnologias linguísticas. Essa diversidade linguística também resulta em um ambiente de pesquisa propício ao estudo da linguística comparativa, de contato e histórica - campos que exigem a coleta de dados extensivos de muitas línguas. Afirmamos que a dispersão de dados (em vez de escassez) é o principal obstáculo no desenvolvimento da tecnologia linguística do sul da Ásia e sugerimos que o estudo da história da linguagem está alinhado de maneira única com a superação desse obstáculo. Revisamos os desenvolvimentos recentes e na interseção da PNL do Sul da Ásia e da linguística histórico-comparativa, descrevendo nossos esforços atuais e de outros nessa área. Também oferecemos novas estratégias para quebrar a barreira dos dados.', 'ja': '南アジアには多くの言語がありますが、その多くは新しい言語技術へのアクセスが深刻に不足しています。この言語の多様性は、多くの言語から広範なデータを収集する必要がある比較言語学、接触言語学、歴史言語学の分野の研究に有利な研究環境をもたらす。南アジアの言語技術の発展における主な障害は（希少性ではなく）データの散在であると主張し、言語史の研究がこの障害の克服と一意に整合していることを示唆している。私たちは、南アジアのNLPと歴史比較言語学の交差点における最近の発展をレビューし、この分野における私たちと他の人々の現在の取り組みを説明します。また、データバリアを打破するための新しい戦略も提供しています。', 'zh': '南亚者,大言之源,多言多乏新语。 此言多样性亦有利于一,接语言学史之所究 - 须多种语言大数。 臣等言数分散性(而非稀缺性)南亚言术之大碍,以为语言史研克一也。 顾南亚NLP史之语言学最新,述我众人之力。 供破数障之新策略。', 'hi': 'दक्षिण एशिया भाषाओं की एक बहुतायत का घर है, जिनमें से कई में नई भाषा प्रौद्योगिकियों तक पहुंच की गंभीर रूप से कमी है। इस भाषाई विविधता के परिणामस्वरूप तुलनात्मक, संपर्क और ऐतिहासिक भाषाविज्ञान के अध्ययन के लिए अनुकूल अनुसंधान वातावरण भी होता है - ऐसे क्षेत्र जो कई भाषाओं से व्यापक डेटा एकत्र करने की आवश्यकता होती है। हम दावा करते हैं कि डेटा बिखरा हुआपन (कमी के बजाय) दक्षिण एशियाई भाषा प्रौद्योगिकी के विकास में प्राथमिक बाधा है, और सुझाव देते हैं कि भाषा के इतिहास का अध्ययन विशिष्ट रूप से इस बाधा को पार करने के साथ संरेखित है। हम दक्षिण एशियाई एनएलपी और ऐतिहासिक-तुलनात्मक भाषाविज्ञान के चौराहे पर हाल के विकास की समीक्षा करते हैं, इस क्षेत्र में हमारे और दूसरों के वर्तमान प्रयासों का वर्णन करते हैं। हम डेटा बाधा को तोड़ने की दिशा में नई रणनीतियां भी प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В Южной Азии существует множество языков, многие из которых крайне не имеют доступа к новым языковым технологиям. Это лингвистическое разнообразие также приводит к созданию исследовательской среды, способствующей изучению сравнительной, контактной и исторической лингвистики - полей, которые требуют сбора обширных данных со многих языков. Мы утверждаем, что разбросанность данных (а не их нехватка) является основным препятствием в развитии языковой технологии в Южной Азии, и предлагаем, чтобы изучение истории языка было однозначно связано с преодолением этого препятствия. Мы рассматриваем последние события в Южной Азии и на стыке НЛП и исторической сравнительной лингвистики, описывая наши и другие текущие усилия в этой области. Мы также предлагаем новые стратегии по преодолению информационного барьера.', 'ga': 'Tá raidhse teangacha san Áise Theas, agus tá go leor acu in easnamh go mór ar theicneolaíochtaí nua teanga. Cruthaíonn an éagsúlacht teanga seo freisin timpeallacht taighde a chuidíonn le staidéar a dhéanamh ar theangeolaíocht chomparáideach, theagmhála agus stairiúil ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------. Maíonn muid gurb é scaipthe sonraí (seachas ganntanas) an príomh-chonstaic ar fhorbairt theicneolaíocht teanga na hÁise Theas, agus molaimid go bhfuil staidéar ar stair teanga ailínithe go haonarach leis an mbac seo a shárú. Déanaimid athbhreithniú ar fhorbairtí le déanaí i agus ag crosbhealach NLP na hÁise Theas agus teangeolaíocht chomparáideach stairiúil, ag cur síos ar ár n-iarrachtaí reatha agus iarrachtaí daoine eile sa réimse seo. Cuirimid straitéisí nua ar fáil freisin chun an bacainn sonraí a shárú.', 'ka': 'სამხრეთ აზია ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან არსებობს ახალი ენის ტექნოლოგიების შესახებ. ეს ლენგურისტიკური განსხვავებას ასევე გავაკეთება სწორედ განსხვავებული, კონტაქტიკური და ისტორიური ლენგურისტიკური განსხვავებას, რომლებიც მრავალის განსხვავებული მონაცემების შესაბამისათ ჩვენ ვთქვათ, რომ სამხრეთ აზიანის ტექნოლოგიის განვითარებაში მონაცემები (უფრო არსებობის) უფრო დიდი ბედნიერი არის სამხრეთ აზიანიური ენის ტექნოლოგიის განვითარებაში, და ვთქვათ, რომ ენის ისტორიის კვლ ჩვენ ახალი განვითარებაში და სამხრეთ აზიანეთის NLP და ისტორიო-კომპორაციური ენგონისტიკის კვლევაში შევხედავთ, რომლებიც ჩვენი და სხვების მიმდინარე ძალადობების განახლებ ჩვენ ასევე ახალი სტრატიგიები მონაცემების ბარიერის გახსნა.', 'hu': 'Dél-Ázsia számos nyelvnek ad otthont, amelyek közül sok súlyosan hiányzik az új nyelvtechnológiákhoz való hozzáférés. Ez a nyelvi sokszínűség olyan kutatási környezetet is eredményez, amely elősegíti az összehasonlító, kapcsolattartó és történelmi nyelvészet tanulmányozását - olyan területeket, amelyek számos nyelvről kiterjedt adatok gyűjtését teszik szükségessé. Azt állítjuk, hogy a dél-ázsiai nyelvtechnológia fejlődésének elsődleges akadálya az adatszórtság (nem pedig a hiány), és azt sugalljuk, hogy a nyelvtörténet tanulmányozása egyedülállóan összhangban áll ennek az akadálynak a leküzdésével. Áttekintjük a dél-ázsiai NLP és a történelmi-összehasonlító nyelvészet közelmúltbeli fejleményeit és kereszteződését, bemutatva a mi és mások jelenlegi erőfeszítéseit ezen a területen. Új stratégiákat is kínálunk az adatok akadályának áttörésére.', 'el': 'Η Νότια Ασία φιλοξενεί πληθώρα γλωσσών, πολλές από τις οποίες δεν έχουν πρόσβαση σε νέες γλωσσικές τεχνολογίες. Αυτή η γλωσσική πολυμορφία οδηγεί επίσης σε ένα ερευνητικό περιβάλλον που ευνοεί τη μελέτη της συγκριτικής, της επαφής και της ιστορικής γλωσσολογίας -τομείς που απαιτούν τη συλλογή εκτεταμένων δεδομένων από πολλές γλώσσες. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι η διασπορά δεδομένων (και όχι η σπανιότητα) είναι το κύριο εμπόδιο στην ανάπτυξη της τεχνολογίας γλώσσας της Νότιας Ασίας, και προτείνουμε ότι η μελέτη της γλωσσικής ιστορίας είναι μοναδικά ευθυγραμμισμένη με την υπέρβαση αυτού του εμποδίου. Εξετάζουμε τις πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην περιοχή και στη διασταύρωση της Νότιας Ασίας με την ιστορική-συγκριτική γλωσσολογία, περιγράφοντας τις τρέχουσες προσπάθειες μας και άλλων στον τομέα αυτό. Προσφέρουμε επίσης νέες στρατηγικές για την υπέρβαση του φραγμού δεδομένων.', 'it': "L'Asia meridionale ospita una pletora di lingue, molte delle quali mancano gravemente di accesso alle nuove tecnologie linguistiche. Questa diversità linguistica si traduce anche in un ambiente di ricerca favorevole allo studio della linguistica comparata, di contatto e storica - campi che richiedono la raccolta di dati estesi da molte lingue. Sosteniamo che la dispersione dei dati (piuttosto che la scarsità) sia l'ostacolo principale nello sviluppo della tecnologia linguistica dell'Asia meridionale, e suggeriamo che lo studio della storia della lingua sia allineato in modo univoco con il superamento di questo ostacolo. Esaminiamo i recenti sviluppi in e all'intersezione tra PNL dell'Asia meridionale e linguistica storico-comparativa, descrivendo gli sforzi attuali dei nostri e degli altri in questo settore. Offriamo anche nuove strategie per superare la barriera dei dati.", 'kk': 'Оңтүстік Азия тілдердің көпшілігі жаңа тіл технологияларына қатынау мүмкін емес. Бұл лингвистикалық әртүрлі түрлі тілдерден кеңейтілген деректерді жинақтау керек өрістерді зерттеу ортасына көмектеседі. Оңтүстік Азия тіл технологиясын жасау үшін деректердің тарихының зерттеулері бұл жағдайда бір-бірінші жағдайды деп ойлаймыз. Оңтүстік Азияның NLP және тарихлық салыстырмалы лингвистикалық тілдерінің жаңа жағдайларды және бұл аумақтағы қазіргі жұмысын түсіндіреді. Мұндай-ақ мәліметтің бариерін бұғаттау үшін жаңа стратегияларды ұсынамыз.', 'lt': 'Pietų Azija yra daugybės kalbų, daugeliui jų labai trūksta galimybių naudotis naujomis kalbų technologijomis. Dėl šios kalbinės įvairovės taip pat atsiranda mokslinių tyrimų aplinka, skatinanti lyginamąją, kontaktinę ir istorinę kalbą – sritis, kurios reikalauja rinkti išsamius duomenis iš daugelio kalbų. Mes teigiame, kad duomenų sklaida (o ne trūkumas) yra pagrindinė kliūtis plėtojant Pietų Azijos kalbų technologijas, ir siūlome, kad kalbos istorijos tyrimas yra vienintelis suderintas su šios kliūties įveikimu. Apžvelgiame neseniai įvykusius pokyčius Pietų Azijos NLP ir istorinės palyginamosios kalbos srityje ir juose aptariame dabartines mūsų ir kitų pastangas šioje srityje. Mes taip pat siūlome naujas duomenų kliūties panaikinimo strategijas.', 'mk': 'Јужна Азија е дом на многумина јазици, од кои многумина сериозно немаат пристап до новите јазички технологии. Оваа јазична различност, исто така, резултира со истражувачка средина која овозможува истражување на споредба, контакт и историска јазика - области кои бараат собирање на екстремни податоци од многу јазици. Ние тврдиме дека распространетоста на податоците (наместо недостатокот) е главната пречка во развојот на технологијата на јужно азискиот јазик, и предлагаме дека студијата на јазичката историја е единствено согласна со надминувањето на оваа пречка. Ние ги прегледуваме неодамнешните настани во и на преминот на Јужна Азија НЛП и историска-споредлива лингвистика, опишувајќи ги нашите и другите актуелни напори во оваа област. Ние, исто така, нудиме нови стратегии за прекинување на бариерата на податоците.', 'ml': 'തെക്ക് ഏഷ്യയില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഷകളിലേക്കാണ് വീട്ടിലേക്കുള്ളത്. അതില്\u200d പലരും പുതിയ ഭാഷ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200dക്ക് പ ഈ ഭാഷ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യാസം ഒരു പഠനത്തിന്റെ പരിസ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് നിരവധി ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിശേഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്ക തെക്ക് ഏഷ്യഭാഷയുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട തടസ്സപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനു പകരം ഡേറ്റാ വ്യത്യസ്തമാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പറയുന്നു. ഭാഷ ചരി ഈ പ്രദേശത്തുള്ള നമ്മുടെയും മറ്റുള്ളവരുടെയും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു ഡേറ്റാ തടസ്സങ്ങള്\u200d തകര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് പുതിയ പദ്ധതികളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Asia Selatan adalah rumah bagi banyak bahasa, kebanyakan daripada mereka sangat kurang akses kepada teknologi bahasa baru. Keberagaman bahasa ini juga menghasilkan persekitaran kajian yang menyebabkan kajian perbandingan, hubungan, dan bahasa sejarah -- bidang yang memerlukan mengumpulkan data luas dari banyak bahasa. Kami menyatakan bahawa penyebaran data (daripada kekurangan) adalah halangan utama dalam pembangunan teknologi bahasa Asia Selatan, dan menyarankan bahawa kajian sejarah bahasa disesuaikan dengan melewati halangan ini. Kami meninjau pembangunan baru-baru ini di dan di persimpangan NLP Asia Selatan dan bahasa perumpamaan sejarah, menggambarkan usaha semasa kita dan orang lain di kawasan ini. Kami juga menawarkan strategi baru untuk memecahkan halangan data.', 'mn': 'Өмнөд Азиа хэл олон хэл гэртээ байдаг. Ихэнх нь шинэ хэл технологийг хүндрэлтэй байдаг. Энэ хэлний олон төрлийн өөрчлөлт нь мөн олон хэлнээс маш их мэдээллийг цуглуулах шаардлагатай судалгааны орчинд харьцуулах, холбоотой, түүхийн хэлний хэлний судалгаанд нөлөөлдөг. Өмнөд Азийн хэл технологи хөгжүүлэхэд мэдээллийн түүхийн судалгаа хэл түүхийн тухай нэг хэмжээтэй холбоотой гэдгийг бид хэлж байна. Өмнөд Азийн NLP болон түүхтэй харьцуулсан хэлний хөгжлийг бид саяхан харуулж, өөрсдийгөө бусад хүмүүсийн хичээлийг энэ хэсэгт тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн бид өгөгдлийн саад хязгаарыг зогсоохын тулд шинэ стратеги өгдөг.', 'no': 'Sør-Asia er heime til eit plethora av språk, mange av dei manglar stort tilgang til nye språk-teknologi. Denne lingviske mangfoldet fører også i eit forskningsmiljø som tilfører studien av sammenlignbare, kontakt og historisk språk - felt som nødvendig å samla store data frå mange språk. Vi tvar at data-spredning (i staden for feil) er den viktigste hindringen i utviklinga av Sør-Asiatisk språk-teknologi, og foreslår at studien av språk-historien er enkelt alignert med overmontering av denne hindringen. Vi gjennomgår nyleg utviklingar i og ved avkryssinga av Sørasiatisk NLP og historisk sammenlignbare lingvistikk, og beskriver gjeldande forsøk i dette området våre og andre. Vi tilbyr også nye strategier til å bryta databarrieret.', 'pl': 'Azja Południowa jest domem wielu języków, z których wiele poważnie brakuje dostępu do nowych technologii językowych. Ta różnorodność językowa skutkuje również środowiskiem badawczym sprzyjającym badaniu językoznawstwa porównawczego, kontaktowego i historycznego – dziedzin, które wymagają gromadzenia obszernych danych z wielu języków. Twierdzimy, że rozproszenie danych (a nie niedobór) jest główną przeszkodą w rozwoju technologii językowej Azji Południowej i sugerujemy, że badanie historii języka jest wyjątkowo dostosowane do pokonywania tej przeszkody. Przeglądamy ostatnie wydarzenia w zakresie i na skrzyżowaniu południowoazjatyckiego NLP i językoznawstwa historyczno-porównawczego, opisując aktualne wysiłki naszych i innych osób w tej dziedzinie. Oferujemy również nowe strategie przełamania bariery danych.', 'ro': 'Asia de Sud găzduiește o multitudine de limbi, multe dintre care lipsesc grav accesul la noile tehnologii lingvistice. Această diversitate lingvistică duce, de asemenea, la un mediu de cercetare favorabil studiului lingvistic comparativ, de contact și istoric - domenii care necesită colectarea de date extinse din multe limbi. Susținem că dispersarea datelor (mai degrabă decât lipsa) este obstacolul principal în dezvoltarea tehnologiei limbii din Asia de Sud și sugerăm că studiul istoriei limbii este aliniat unic cu depășirea acestui obstacol. Revizuim evoluțiile recente în și la intersecția dintre PNL din Asia de Sud și lingvistica istoric-comparativă, descriind eforturile actuale ale noastre și ale altora în acest domeniu. De asemenea, oferim noi strategii pentru depășirea barierei datelor.', 'si': 'දකුණු ආසියාව තමයි භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගෙදර ඉන්නවා, ඒ වගේම අනුව භාෂා තාක්ෂණාවක්ෂණය අවශ මේ භාෂාවික විශේෂ විශේෂ වර්තනයක් තියෙනවා පරීක්ෂණාව සම්බන්ධය, සම්බන්ධය, අතිත්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාවිකාරීතික විශේෂ අපි කියන්නේ දත්ත විස්තරය (අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් නැතිව) දකුණු ආසියාව භාෂා තාක්ෂණයේ විස්තරයේ ප්\u200dරධාන අවධානය කියලා, සහ භාෂා ඉතිහාසය අපි අලුත් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා දකුණු ආසියානු NLP සහ ඉතිහාසික භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක වර්තනය කරනව අපි තොරතුරු බාධාරයක් විනාශ කරන්න අළුත් ව්\u200dයාපෘතියක් අරගෙන ඉඩ දෙනවා.', 'sr': 'Južna Azija je doma jezika, od kojih mnogi teško nedostaju pristup novim jezičkim tehnologijama. Ova lingvistička raznolikost takođe rezultuje i istraživanje okoliša koja povezuje istraživanje usporednog, kontakta i istorijskog lingvističkog polja, koje zahteva okupljanje širokih podataka iz mnogih jezika. Tvrdimo da je raspršivanje podataka (umjesto nedostatka) glavna prepreka razvoja južnoazijske tehnologije jezika i sugeriramo da je studija istorije jezika jedinstveno usklađena sa preprekom. Pregledavamo nedavne razvoje u Južnoazijskom NLP-u i istorijski komparativnoj jezičini, opisujući trenutne napore naših i drugih u ovom području. Takođe nudimo nove strategije za prekršanje barijere podataka.', 'so': 'Aasiya Koonfureed wuxuu ku yaalaa luqado badan, kuwaas oo qaarkood si adag u baahan inay helo teknolojiyo cusub oo luqada ah. Luqaddaas kala duduwan wuxuu sidoo kale ka resultiyaa deegaan waxbarasho oo ku saabsan barashada iskutarka, xiriirka, iyo luuqadaha taariikhda ah, kaas oo u baahan ururista macluumaadka kala duduwan ee luuqadaha badan. Waxaynu sheegaynaa in macluumaadka kala firidhsanaan (ka badala khatar) waa obstacka ugu horeeya horumarinta teknolojiga afka koonfureed ee Aasiya, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa in waxbarashada taariikhda afka ku qoran si gaar ah looga dhigo qalabkan. Waxaannu ka fiirinaynaa horumarinta ugu dambeysay ee koonfureed Aasiya NLP iyo luuqadaha taariikhda isbarbardhigta, si aan u qorno hawlahayaga iyo wadanka kale. Sidoo kale waxaynu siinaynaa qoraal cusub oo aan jebino qalabka macluumaadka.', 'sv': 'Sydasien är hem för en uppsjö av språk, varav många allvarligt saknar tillgång till ny språkteknik. Denna språkliga mångfald resulterar också i en forskningsmiljö som främjar studier av komparativ, kontakt och historisk lingvistik - områden som kräver insamling av omfattande data från många språk. Vi hävdar att dataspridning (snarare än knapphet) är det främsta hindret i utvecklingen av sydasiatisk språkteknik, och föreslår att studiet av språkhistoria är unikt anpassat till att övervinna detta hinder. Vi granskar den senaste utvecklingen i och i skärningspunkten mellan sydasiatisk NLP och historisk-komparativ lingvistik och beskriver våra och andras nuvarande insatser inom detta område. Vi erbjuder också nya strategier för att bryta databarriären.', 'ta': 'தென் ஆசியாவின் முழு மொழிகளுக்கும் வீட்டில் உள்ளது, அதில் அநேகர் புதிய மொழியின் தொழில்நுட்ப தொழில்நு இந்த மொழியின் பல்வேறு மாறுபாடு தென் ஆசியாவின் மொழி தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் உருவாக்கத்தில் தரவு பரப்பும் (அச்சத்திற்கு பதிலாக) என்று நாம் கூறுகிறோம். மொழி வரலாற்றின் ஆய்வு தன நாங்கள் சமீபத்தில் மற்றும் தென் ஆசியான NLP மற்றும் வரலாற்று ஒப்பீடு மொழிகளின் இடைவெளியில் நடப்பு முயற்சிகளை விவரிக்கிறோம். நாம் தரவு தடை உடைக்க புதிய திட்டங்களை வழங்குகிறோம்.', 'mt': "L-Asja t’Isfel hija d-dar ta’ ħafna lingwi, li ħafna minnhom m’għandhomx a ċċess qawwi għal teknoloġiji ġodda tal-lingwi. Din id-diversità lingwistika tirriżulta wkoll f’ambjent ta’ riċerka li jwassal għall-istudju ta’ oqsma lingwistiċi komparattivi, ta’ kuntatt u storiċi li jeħtieġu l-ġbir ta’ dejta estensiva minn ħafna lingwi. Aħna niddikjaraw li t-tixrid tad-dejta (minflok l-iskarsezza) huwa l-ostaklu ewlieni fl-iżvilupp tat-teknoloġija tal-lingwa tal-Asja t’Isfel, u ssuġġerixxu li l-istudju tal-istorja tal-lingwa huwa allinjat unikament mal-eliminazzjoni ta’ dan l-ostaklu. Aħna nirrevedu l-iżviluppi reċenti fl-intersezzjoni tal-NLP tan-Nofsinhar tal-Asja u l-lingwistika storika-komparattiva, u niddeskrivu l-isforzi attwali tagħna u oħrajn f'dan il-qasam. Aħna noffru wkoll strateġiji ġodda biex inkisru l-ostaklu tad-dejta.", 'ur': 'جنوبی آسیا ایک کل زبانوں کے گھر ہے، ان میں سے بہت سے لوگ نئی زبان تکنولوژی کے لئے زیادہ دسترسی نہیں رکھتے۔ یہ زبان کی مختلفیت بھی ایک تحقیقات آنکھوں میں بھی نتیجہ دیتی ہے جو بہت سی زبانوں سے پھیرنے کی ضرورت رکھتی ہے۔ ہم کہتے ہیں کہ ڈیٹا پراگندگی (بغیر کمزوری) جنوبی آسیا زبان تکنولوژی کی توسعہ میں سب سے زیادہ پراگندہ ہے، اور اس کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہے کہ زبان تاریخ کی تحقیق ایک طرح ایک طرح کے ساتھ اس پراگندہ ہے۔ ہم اگلے اگلوں کی تغییرات جنوبی آسیا کی NLP اور تاریخی مثالفیت زبان شناسی میں اور اس منطقه میں ہمارے اور دوسروں کے اگلوں کی کوشش کی تعریف کرتے ہیں. ہم نے نیا استراتژیکوں کو بھی ڈیٹ بندر کو توڑنے کے لئے پیش کیا ہے.', 'uz': "Janubiy Osiyo har bir tillarda bo'lgan bo'lgan edi. Bu yerda ko'pchilik yangi tillar teknolojiga murakkablik yo'q. Bu tillarning tarkibi tarkibi esa, bir necha tillardan ko'proq maʼlumotni olishga ega bo'lgan o'rganish muhimbasini o'rganish mumkin. We claim that data scatteredness (rather than scarcity) is the primary obstacle in the development of South Asian language technology, and suggest that the study of language history is uniquely aligned with surmounting this obstacle.  Yaqinda, Janubiy Asian NLP va tarixi tilning tarkibini o'qituvchimiz va bu yerda bizning va boshqa bir harakatlarni o'rganamiz. Va biz maʼlumotlar tizimini birlashtirish uchun yangi strategiya qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Nam Á là ngôi nhà của hàng đống ngôn ngữ, nhiều trong số đó thiếu nghiêm trọng quyền truy cập vào các công nghệ ngôn ngữ mới. Sự đa dạng ngôn ngữ này cũng dẫn đến một môi trường nghiên cứu phù hợp cho nghiên cứu về ngữ pháp tương đối, liên lạc và lịch sử, những lĩnh vực cần phải thu thập dữ liệu rộng từ nhiều ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi khẳng định rằng độ phân tán dữ liệu (thay vì khan hiếm) là cản trở chính trong việc phát triển công nghệ ngôn ngữ Nam Á, và cho rằng nghiên cứu lịch sử ngôn ngữ được hợp nhất với việc vượt qua chướng ngại này. Chúng tôi xem xét những tiến triển gần đây trong và tại giao điểm của ngôn ngữ học Nam Á và so sánh lịch sử, mô tả những nỗ lực hiện tại của chúng tôi và những người khác trong lĩnh vực này. Chúng tôi cũng đưa ra những chiến lược mới để phá vỡ ranh giới dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Южна Азия е дом на изобилие от езици, много от които сериозно нямат достъп до нови езикови технологии. Това езиково разнообразие също води до изследователска среда, благоприятна за изучаването на сравнителната, контактната и историческата лингвистика - области, които изискват събирането на обширни данни от много езици. Ние твърдим, че разпръскването на данните (а не недостигът) е основната пречка в развитието на езиковата технология в Южна Азия и предполагаме, че изучаването на езиковата история е уникално в съответствие с преодоляването на тази пречка. Преглеждаме последните събития в и на пресечната точка на Югоазиатската НЛП и историческо-сравнителната лингвистика, описвайки нашите и настоящите усилия на другите в тази област. Предлагаме и нови стратегии за преодоляване на бариерата за данни.', 'da': 'Sydasien er hjemsted for en overflod af sprog, hvoraf mange alvorligt mangler adgang til nye sprogteknologier. Denne sproglige mangfoldighed resulterer også i et forskningsmiljø, der fremmer studiet af komparativ, kontakt og historisk lingvistik - områder, der kræver indsamling af omfattende data fra mange sprog. Vi hævder, at dataspredning (snarere end knaphed) er den primære hindring i udviklingen af sydasiatisk sprogteknologi, og foreslår, at studiet af sproghistorie er unikt afstemt med at overvinde denne hindring. Vi gennemgår den seneste udvikling i og i krydset mellem Sydasiatisk NLP og historisk-komparativ lingvistik og beskriver vores og andres nuværende indsats på dette område. Vi tilbyder også nye strategier til at bryde databarrieren.', 'nl': 'Zuid-Azië is de thuisbasis van een overvloed aan talen, waarvan vele ernstig gebrek hebben aan toegang tot nieuwe taaltechnologieën. Deze taalverscheidenheid resulteert ook in een onderzoeksomgeving die bevorderlijk is voor de studie van vergelijkende, contact- en historische taalkunde – gebieden die het verzamelen van uitgebreide gegevens uit vele talen vereisen. We beweren dat dataverspreiding (in plaats van schaarste) het primaire obstakel is in de ontwikkeling van Zuid-Aziatische taaltechnologie, en suggereren dat de studie van de taalgeschiedenis uniek is afgestemd op het overwinnen van dit obstakel. We bekijken recente ontwikkelingen in en op het snijvlak van Zuid-Aziatische NLP en historisch-vergelijkende taalkunde en beschrijven onze en andermans huidige inspanningen op dit gebied. We bieden ook nieuwe strategieën aan om de databarrière te doorbreken.', 'hr': 'Južna Azija je doma jezika, od kojih mnogi teško nedostaju pristup novim jezičkim tehnologijama. Ova jezička raznolikost također rezultira u istraživačkom okruženju koja će omogućiti ispitivanje usporednog, kontakta i istorijskog jezičkog polja -- polja koje zahtijevaju okupljanje širokih podataka iz mnogih jezika. Tvrdimo da je raspršivanje podataka (umjesto nedostatka) glavna prepreka razvoja južnoazijske tehnologije jezika i sugeriramo da je ispitivanje povijesti jezika jedinstveno usklađeno s prekršavanjem te prepreke. Pregledavamo nedavne razvoje u Južnoazijskom NLP-u i istorijskom poređenju jezika, opisujući trenutne napore naših i drugih u ovom području. Također nudimo nove strategije za prekršanje barijere podataka.', 'de': 'Südasien ist Heimat einer Vielzahl von Sprachen, von denen viele schwer Zugang zu neuen Sprachtechnologien haben. Diese sprachliche Vielfalt führt auch zu einem Forschungsumfeld, das für das Studium der vergleichenden, kontaktbezogenen und historischen Linguistik förderlich ist – Bereiche, die die Sammlung umfangreicher Daten aus vielen Sprachen erfordern. Wir behaupten, dass Datenstreuung (statt Knappheit) das primäre Hindernis in der Entwicklung südasiatischer Sprachtechnologie ist, und legen nahe, dass das Studium der Sprachgeschichte auf einzigartige Weise darauf ausgerichtet ist, dieses Hindernis zu überwinden. Wir beleuchten die jüngsten Entwicklungen in und an der Schnittstelle von südasiatischem NLP und historisch-vergleichender Linguistik und beschreiben unsere und andere gegenwärtigen Bemühungen in diesem Bereich. Wir bieten auch neue Strategien, um die Datenbarriere zu überwinden.', 'ko': '남아시아는 대량의 언어를 가지고 있는데, 그 중 많은 언어들이 새로운 언어 기술이 심각하게 부족하다.이런 언어의 다양성은 비교언어학을 연구하고 접촉언어학과 역사언어학을 연구하는 데 유리한 연구 환경을 조성했다. 이런 분야는 다양한 언어에서 대량의 데이터를 수집해야 한다.우리는 데이터 분산(희소성이 아니라)이 남아시아 언어 기술 발전의 주요 장애라고 생각하고 언어사 연구와 극복은 유일무이하다고 생각한다.우리는 남아시아 NLP와 역사 비교 언어학의 교차점의 최신 발전을 되돌아보고 이 분야에서 우리와 다른 사람들의 현재 노력을 묘사했다.우리는 데이터 장벽을 깨는 새로운 전략도 제공했다.', 'id': 'Asia Selatan adalah rumah bagi banyak bahasa, banyak dari yang sangat kurang akses ke teknologi bahasa baru. Diversitas bahasa ini juga menghasilkan lingkungan penelitian yang mempengaruhi penelitian tentang perbandingan, kontak, dan lingkungan sejarah -- bidang yang membutuhkan mengumpulkan data ekstensif dari banyak bahasa. Kami mengklaim bahwa kecerdasan data (bukan kekurangan) adalah halangan utama dalam pengembangan teknologi bahasa Asia Selatan, dan menyarankan bahwa penelitian sejarah bahasa secara unik disesuaikan dengan mengatasi halangan ini. Kami memperlihatkan perkembangan baru-baru ini di dan di persimpangan NLP Asia Selatan dan lingwistik perumpamaan sejarah, menjelaskan usaha kita dan yang lainnya saat ini di daerah ini. Kami juga menawarkan strategi baru untuk memecahkan halangan data.', 'fa': 'آسیا جنوبی به یک کلمه زبان خانه است که بسیاری از آن به شدت دسترسی به تکنولوژی های جدید زبان ندارند. این مختلف زبان\u200cشناسی همچنین به یک محیط تحقیقاتی که به مطالعه\u200cی مقایسه، تماس و زبان\u200cشناسی تاریخی باعث می\u200cشود، نتیجه می\u200cدهد. ما ادعا می\u200cکنیم که پراکنده داده\u200cها (به جای کمی) ابتدایی در توسعه تکنولوژی زبان آسیا جنوبی است و پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که مطالعه تاریخ زبان تنها با افزایش این مانع متصل شده است. ما توسعه\u200cهای اخیر و در قطعه\u200cای از NLP آسیا جنوبی و زبان\u200cشناسی تاریخی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، که در این منطقه تلاش\u200cهای فعلی ما و دیگران را توضیح می\u200cدهیم. ما همچنین استراتژی های جدید را برای شکستن بازداشت داده ها پیشنهاد می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Asia ya Kusini ni nyumbani kwa lugha nyingi, ambazo wengi wao hawana upatikanaji wa teknolojia mpya ya lugha. Utofauti huu wa lugha pia unasababisha mazingira ya utafiti yanayohusu utafiti wa lugha zinazolinganisha, mawasiliano na lugha za kihistoria - maeneo ambayo yanahitaji kukusanya takwimu kubwa kutoka lugha nyingi. Tunasema kuwa usambazaji wa taarifa (badala ya kuogopesha) ni vikwazo la msingi katika maendeleo ya teknolojia ya lugha ya Asia ya Kusini, na tunapendekeza kwamba utafiti wa historia ya lugha hauna uwezo wa kuimarisha vikwazo hili. Tunapitia maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika na katikati ya NLP ya Kusini na lugha inayolinganisha na kihistoria, tunaelezea jitihada za sasa za nchi hii. Pia tunatoa mikakati mpya ya kuvunja vikwazo vya taarifa.', 'af': "Suid-Asië is tuis tot 'n plethora van tale, baie van hulle het swaar toegang tot nuwe taal teknologies ontbreek. Hierdie lingwisiese verskeidigheid veroorsaak ook in 'n ondersoek omgewing wat die studie van vergelykbaar, kontak en historiese lingwisiese--velde wat die versameling van uitbreidige data van baie tale nodig het. Ons antwoord dat data verspreiding (eerder as skande) is die primêre hinders in die ontwikkeling van Suid-Asië taal tegnologie, en voorstel dat die studie van taal geskiedenis unieke gelyk is met die verhef van hierdie hinders. Ons hersien onlangse ontwikkelinge in en by die interseksie van Suid-Asië NLP en historiese-vergelykbare lingvistike, beskrywing van ons en ander se huidige versoekte in hierdie area. Ons offer ook nuwe strategies om die data-barrier te breek.", 'tr': 'Günorta Aziýa täze diller bilen öýde bolýar. Köp adamlaryň täze dil teknolojilerine gol ýetmesi ýok. Bu lingwistiki çeşitlikler hem bir araştyrma çevresinde çykyş, temasy we taryş lingwistiklerin araştyrmasyna köp dilden uly maglumatlar toplamaga gerek bolýar. Günorta Aziýa dil teknolojisiniň gelişmegi üçin bergi daşyrylyklygyny (ýöne ýakynlaşykdan) aýdýarys we dil taryhynyň öwrenmegi şu çözgüt bilen ýekeje çözüldir diýip maslahat berýäris. Günorta Aziýanyň NLP we taryhy-komparat lingwistiklerinde ýakynlaşyklaryny we günorta Aziýanyň çabalarymyzy bu bölgede belirleýäris. Mundan hem data barrisyny döwürmekde täze strategiýalary teklip edýäris.', 'sq': 'Azia e Jugut është shtëpia e një shumicë gjuhësh, shumë prej të cilave mjaft mungon akses ndaj teknologjive të reja gjuhësh. Ky diversitet gjuhësor rezulton gjithashtu në një mjedis kërkimi që favorizon studimin e gjuhës krahasuese, kontaktuese dhe historike -- fusha që kërkojnë mbledhjen e të dhënave të gjerë nga shumë gjuhë. Ne pretendojmë se shpërndarja e të dhënave (në vend të mungesës) është pengesa kryesore në zhvillimin e teknologjisë së gjuhës së Azisë së Jugut dhe sugjerojmë se studimi i historisë së gjuhës është i përshtatshëm unikisht me kapërcimin e kësaj pengese. Ne shqyrtojmë zhvillimet e fundit në dhe në ndërprerjen e NLP të Azisë Juglindore dhe gjuhës historike-krahasuese, duke përshkruar përpjekjet tona dhe të tjerëve aktuale në këtë fushë. Ne ofrojmë gjithashtu strategji të reja drejt thyerjes së pengesës së të dhënave.', 'am': 'ደቡብ እስያ የቋንቋዎች ቋንቋዎች ወደፊት ነው፤ ከእነዚህም ብዙዎቹ አዲስ ቋንቋ ቴክኖጂ መግኘት አያስፈልጉም፡፡ ይህ ቋንቋዊ ልዩ ልዩነት በብዙ ቋንቋዎች የጥያቄ፥ ግንኙነት እና ታሪካዊ ቋንቋዎች ትምህርት ለማግኘት የሚችል ትምህርት አካባቢ ነው፡፡ የዳታ ትርፋት (ድካም ሳይሆን) የደቡብ የእስያ ቋንቋ ቴክኖጂ መፍጠር መጀመሪያ ግንኙነት ነው እና የቋንቋ ታሪክ ትምህርት ይህ ግንኙነት በመግለጥ የተለየ ነው ብለን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የቀድሞው የአሜሪካ አሜሪካ (NLP) እና ታሪካዊ ቋንቋዎች እና የአሁኑን ድጋፍ በዚህ ክፍል እና የሌሎችን ድጋፍ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ የዳታ ግንኙነትን ለመቀጠል አዲስ strategy እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'South Asia is home to a plethora of languages, many of which severely lack access to new language technologies.  Այս լեզվաբանական բազմազանությունը նաև հանգեցնում է հետազոտության միջավայրին, որը օգնում է համեմատական, հաղորդակցման և պատմական լեզվաբանության ուսումնասիրելու համար, ոլորտներ, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են բազմաթիվ լեզվով ստացված էքսպան Մենք պնդում ենք, որ տվյալների տարածումը (ոչ թե բազմաթիվ) հիմնական խոչընդոտը Հարավային Ասիայի լեզվի տեխնոլոգիաների զարգացման մեջ է, և առաջարկում ենք, որ լեզվի պատմության ուսումնասիրությունը միանգամայն համապատասխանում է այս խոչընդոտի վեր Մենք վերլուծում ենք Հարավային Ասիայի ՆԼՊ-ի վերջին զարգացումները և դրանց հատվածը և պատմական-համեմատական լեզվաբանությունը, նկարագրելով մեր և ուրիշների ներկայիս ջանքերը այս ոլորտում: We also offer new strategies towards breaking the data barrier.', 'bn': 'দক্ষিণ এশিয়া একটি পুরো ভাষায় বাড়ি আছে, যার মধ্যে অনেকেই নতুন ভাষার প্রযুক্তির প্রবেশের অভাব নেই। এই ভাষার বৈচিত্র্যের ফলে গবেষণার পরিবেশের সাথে তুলনা, যোগাযোগ এবং ঐতিহাসিক ভাষার গবেষণার ক্ষেত্রে সুযোগ প্রদান করা- ক্ষেত্রে যা অনেক ভাষা আমরা দাবি করি যে তথ্য ছড়িয়ে পড়া (ভয়াবহতার পরিবর্তে) দক্ষিণ এশিয়ার ভাষা প্রযুক্তির উন্নয়নের প্রধান বাধা, আর পরামর্শ দিয়েছে যে ভাষার ইতিহাসের গবেষণা  আমরা সম্প্রতি দক্ষিণ এশিয়ার এনএলপি এবং ঐতিহাসিক-তুলনামূলক ভাষার মধ্যে উন্নয়নগুলো পর্যবেক্ষণ করি, এই এলাকার বর্তমান প্রচেষ্টার বর্ণনা করছি। তথ্য বাধা ভেঙ্গে ফেলার জন্য আমরা নতুন কৌশল প্রদান করি।', 'az': 'Cənubi Aziya dillərin çoxunun yeni dil teknolojilərinə müvəffəqiyyəti yoxdur. Bu dil müxtəlifliyi də müxtəlif bir araştırma ortamına bənzər dillərdən böyük məlumatlar toplaması lazımdır. Biz məlumatların dağıtılışının (yoxsulluqdan başqa) Cənubi Asiya dil teknolojisinin inkişafında ilk engel olduğunu iddia edirik və dil keçmişin in təhsil edilməsini təklif edirik. Biz Günəş Aziya NLP və tarixi-komparasiv dil istiqamətlərinin, bu bölgedə bizim və digərinizin ağır çabalarını təsdiqləyirik. Biz də məlumat barjerini qırmaq üçün yeni strateji təklif edirik.', 'bs': 'Južna Azija je doma jezika, od kojih mnogi teško nedostaju pristup novim jezičkim tehnologijama. Ova jezička raznolikost također rezultira u istraživačkom okruženju koja će omogućiti ispitivanje usporedbenih, kontakata i istorijskih jezičkih polja, koje zahtijevaju okupljanje širokih podataka iz mnogih jezika. Tvrdimo da je raspršivanje podataka (umjesto nedostatka) glavna prepreka razvoja južnoazijske tehnologije jezika, i sugeriramo da je studija povijesti jezika jedinstveno usklađena s preprekom. Pregledavamo nedavne razvoje u Južnoazijskom NLP-u i u međusobnom dijelu i istorijskog poređenja jezika, opisujući trenutne napore naših i drugih u ovom području. Također nudimo nove strategije za prekršanje barijere podataka.', 'ca': "Àsia del Sud està a casa d'una gran quantitat de llengües, moltes de les quals no tenen acces a les noves tecnologies de llengües. Aquesta diversitat lingüística també resulta en un entorn de recerca favorable a l'estudi de la lingüística comparativa, de contacte i històrica, camps que necessiten la recopilació de dades extenses de moltes llengües. Afirmem que la dispersió de dades (en lloc d'escassetat) és el principal obstacle al desenvolupament de la tecnologia del llenguatge sud-asiàtic, i suggerem que l'estudi de la història del llenguatge està unicament allinjat amb superar aquest obstacle. Examinem els desenvolupaments recents en i a la intersecció del NLP sud-asiàtic i la lingüística històrica-comparativa, descriuent els nostres esforços actuals en aquesta àrea. We also offer new strategies towards breaking the data barrier.", 'et': 'Lõuna-Aasias elab palju keeli, millest paljudel puudub tõsiselt juurdepääs uutele keeltehnoloogiatele. Selle keelelise mitmekesisuse tulemuseks on ka uurimiskeskkond, mis soodustab võrdleva, kontakti- ja ajaloolise keeleteaduse uurimist - valdkonnad, mis nõuavad ulatuslike andmete kogumist paljudest keeltest. Väidame, et Lõuna-Aasia keeletehnoloogia arengu peamiseks takistuseks on andmete hajutus (mitte nappus), ning soovitame, et keeleajaloo uurimine on unikaalselt kooskõlas selle takistuse ületamisega. Me vaatame üle hiljutised arengud Lõuna-Aasia NLP ja ajaloo-võrdleva keeleteaduse lõikumisel, kirjeldades meie ja teiste praeguseid jõupingutusi selles valdkonnas. Pakume ka uusi strateegiaid andmebarjääri ületamiseks.', 'cs': 'Jižní Asie je domovem mnoha jazyků, z nichž mnohé vážně postrádají přístup k novým jazykovým technologiím. Tato jazyková rozmanitost rovněž vede k výzkumnému prostředí, které přispívá ke studiu srovnávací, kontaktní a historické lingvistiky – oborů, které vyžadují shromažďování rozsáhlých dat z mnoha jazyků. Tvrdíme, že rozptýlenost dat (spíše než nedostatek) je hlavní překážkou ve vývoji jihoasijských jazykových technologií, a naznačujeme, že studium jazykových dějin je jedinečně v souladu s překonáním této překážky. Shromáždíme nedávný vývoj v oblasti a na křižovatce jihoasijského NLP a historicko-komparativní lingvistiky a popisujeme současné snahy našich a ostatních v této oblasti. Nabízíme také nové strategie k prolomení datové bariéry.', 'fi': 'Etelä-Aasiassa asuu lukuisia kieliä, joista monilla ei ole mahdollisuutta käyttää uutta kieliteknologiaa. Tämä kielellinen monimuotoisuus johtaa myös tutkimusympäristöön, joka edistää vertailevan, kontakti- ja historiallisen kielitieteen tutkimusta - aloilla, jotka edellyttävät laajan tiedon keräämistä monista kielistä. Väitämme, että tiedon hajanaisuus (eikä niukkuus) on tärkein este Etelä-Aasian kieliteknologian kehityksessä, ja ehdotamme, että kielihistorian tutkimus on ainutlaatuisen linjassa tämän esteen voittamisen kanssa. Tarkastelemme Etelä-Aasian NLP:n ja historiallisesti vertailevan kielitieteen viimeaikaista kehitystä ja niiden risteyksessä kuvaamalla meidän ja muiden tämänhetkisiä ponnisteluja tällä alalla. Tarjoamme myös uusia strategioita datamuurin murtamiseksi.', 'ha': "Afrika Kusini yana da gidan wata takarda harshe, masu yawa daga cikinsu bã su da matsayin zane-yanzu. This linguistic diversity also results in a research environment conducive to the study of comparative, contact, and historical linguistics--fields which necessitate the gathering of extensive data from many languages.  Tuna dai, wãtsa da data (bã ya kasancẽwa) shi ne mafi ƙaranci a developer technical na lugha Asiya Kusini, kuma tuna shawarar da ake sami karatun historin harshen na musamman da za'a sami wannan hancin. Tuna karatun mafariko na farko a tsakanin NLP na Sũgaban Asian na Sũgaba da linguistic na historical-sami'a, suna bayyana aikin mu da waɗansu aikin da ke kai yanzu a cikin wannan wuri. Kayya, Munã sami akan mutane da za'a kakkãta danne.", 'he': 'South Asia is home to a plethora of languages, many of which severely lack access to new language technologies.  מגוון שפתי זה גם מוביל בסביבה מחקרית שמתועלת למחקר של שיוואי, קשר, והשפתיים היסטוריות - שדות שדורשים לאסוף נתונים רחבים משפות רבות. We claim that data scatteredness (rather than scarcity) is the primary obstacle in the development of South Asian language technology, and suggest that the study of language history is uniquely aligned with surmounting this obstacle.  אנו משגיחים על התפתחות האחרונות בתחום הדרום אסיאטי NLP והשפתיים ההיסטוריות-השוואות, ומתארים את המאמצים הנוכחים שלנו ואחרים באזור הזה. אנחנו גם מציעים אסטרטגיות חדשות לכיוון שבירת מחסום המידע.', 'sk': 'Južna Azija je dom številnih jezikov, od katerih mnogi resno nimajo dostopa do novih jezikovnih tehnologij. Ta jezikovna raznolikost prav tako vodi v raziskovalno okolje, ki spodbuja študij primerjalne, kontaktne in zgodovinske jezikoslovje – področja, ki zahtevajo zbiranje obsežnih podatkov iz številnih jezikov. Trdimo, da je razpršenost podatkov (namesto pomanjkanja) glavna ovira pri razvoju jezikovne tehnologije južne Azije, in namigujemo, da je študij jezikovne zgodovine edinstveno usklajen s premagovanjem te ovire. Pregledujemo najnovejše dogajanje v in na križišču južnoazijskega NLP in zgodovinsko-primerjalnega jezikoslovja ter opisujemo naša in drugih trenutna prizadevanja na tem področju. Ponujamo tudi nove strategije za prekinitev pregrade podatkov.', 'bo': 'ལྷོ་ཨ་ཤི་ཡུལ་ཁྱབ་ནས་སྐད་རིགས་གསར་བ་ལ་ཁང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇུག་པ་རེད། འདི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་འཕེལ་རི སྐད ང་ཚོས་མང་གསལ་བརྗོད་བྱས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་ལྷག་ཁང་ཅིག་གནད་མེད་པར། ང་ཚོས་ཉེ་ཆར་བར་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དང་ལྷོག་ཨ་ཤི་ཡི་NLP(South Asian NLP)དང་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་ལ་ཆོག ང་ཚོས་ཞུགས་ཆགས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགོག་བྱེད་པར་བྱེད་སྲོལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གསར་བ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Sud-Asya iki luwih akeh lan barang langkung sampeyan, akeh akeh liyane sing nganggep bantuan akses teknêlogi sing luwih. Lingué-akeh sing paling-akeh lan tambah mbukak kayané perusahaan kanggo nggambar kapan pangan, sakjane, lan nglanggar aturan--arep kuwi nggawe data sing ngentambah akeh dilawak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngerasai kanggo mbakdalakno kuwi kapan-kapan kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo ngulinakake tarjamahan sing larang, lan nggunakake ngerayakno kanggo ngerasai tarjamah sing luwih apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé beraksi nduwé nggawe barang-barêng lan neng akeh-barêng langgambar sing nggawe barang nggawe barang-barêng sing nggawe barang-barêng kanggo ngilangno nggawe lan nganggo langgambar sing paling iki. Awak dhéwé mungkin ngerti perusahaan anyar kanggo ngilanggar barang data.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'مخلص أم استخلاصي؟ في التخفيف من مفاضلة الإخلاص والتجريد في التلخيص التجريدي', 'pt': 'Fiel ou Extrativista? Sobre a mitigação do trade-off fidelidade-abstratividade na sumarização abstrativa', 'es': '¿Fiel o extractivo? Sobre la mitigación de la compensación entre fidelidad y abstractividad en la sumarización abstractiva', 'fr': 'Fidèle ou extractif\xa0? Atténuer le compromis entre fidélité et abstraction dans la synthèse abstraite', 'ja': '忠実か抽象か？抽象的な要約での忠実性-抽象性のトレードオフの軽減について', 'ru': 'Верный или экстрактивный? О смягчении компромисса между верностью и абстрактностью в абстрактном обобщении', 'zh': '忠乎取之? 其在抽象总结中轻忠实度-抽象性权衡', 'hi': 'वफादार या Extractive? ईमानदारी को कम करने पर-Abstractiveness व्यापार-Abstractive Summarization में बंद', 'ga': 'Dílis nó Sliochtach? Ar Mhaolú na Dílseachta-Abstractionness Trádála-Amach in Achoimre Theibí', 'ka': 'სწორედ ან ექსტრაქტური? აბსტრაქტიგური კომპანიზაციაში დამუშავებული მწოდებელობა-აბსტრაქტიგურობა', 'hu': 'Hűséges vagy kivonó? Az absztraktív összefoglalásban a hűség-absztraktivitás cseréjének enyhítéséről', 'el': 'Πιστός ή Εκμεταλλευτικός; Για τον μετριασμό του συμβιβασμού πιστότητας-αφηρημένης συμπεριφοράς στην αφηρημένη περίληψη', 'it': 'Fedele o estrattiva? Sulla mitigazione del compromesso tra fedeltà e astrazione nella sintesi astratta', 'kk': 'Шынымды немесе тарқатуды қалайсыз ба? Абстрактивті тұжырымдамасындағы сенімділік- абстрактивтік тұжырымдамасының көмегімен', 'ms': 'Percaya atau Ekstraktif? Pada Melemahkan Perdagangan Kepercayaan-Abstractiviti dalam Penapisan Abstractif', 'lt': 'Tikrai ar ekstraktyviai? Apie patikimumo ir abstraktyvumo mažinimą abstraktyvioje santraukoje', 'mk': 'Верен или екстрактивен? On Mitigating the Faithfulness-Abstractiveness Trade-off in Abstractive Summarization', 'ml': 'വിശ്വസ്തതയോ പുറത്താക്കാനോ? അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിറ്റിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം', 'mt': 'Fejali jew Estrattivi? Dwar it-tnaqqis tal-kompromess bejn il-Fejalità u l-Asstrattività fis-Sommarju Abstrattiv', 'no': 'Feil eller utpakke? På å gjennomføring av tryggleikskontrollen og abstraktivitet i abstraktiv sammendrag', 'pl': 'Wierny czy wyciągający? O łagodzeniu kompromisu wierności-abstrakcyjności w streszczeniu', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ итгэлтэй эсвэл татах уу? Үнэндээ итгэлтэй, эзэмшигтэй худалдааныг багасгах тухай', 'ro': 'Credincios sau extractiv? Cu privire la atenuarea compromisului credință-abstractivitate în rezumarea abstractivă', 'sr': 'Verna ili ekstraktivna? U pogoršanju trgovine vernosti i abstraktivnosti u abstraktivnom sažetku', 'si': 'විශ්වාසයි නැත්තම් නැත්තම්? විශ්වාසිත්වත්වත්වත්වත්වත්-අවස්ථාවත්වත් ව්\u200dයාපාරය අවස්ථාවක් සම්පූර්ණයේ', 'so': 'Hubaal ama la saaro? Markii la Miiriyo aaminnimada-Abstractivity-off in Abstractive Summarization', 'sv': 'Trolig eller extraktiv? Om att mildra kompromissen mellan trohet och abstrakt vid abstraktiv sammanfattning', 'ta': 'நம்பிக்கை அல்லது வெளியேற்று? நம்பிக்கை- சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'سچے یا اٹھانے والے ہیں؟ سچائی اور دھوکے کے معاملہ میں دھوکے کے مطابق', 'uz': '@ info Name', 'vi': 'Lạc quan hay tháo? Về việc giảm giảm bớt Tinh thần kinh kinh doanh', 'bg': 'Верен или екстрактивен? За смекчаване на компромиса вярност-абстрактност при абстрактното обобщаване', 'da': 'Trofast eller udtrækkende? Om afhjælpning af kompromiset mellem trofasthed og abstraktivitet i abstrakt sammenfatning', 'nl': 'Trouw of Extractief? Over het verminderen van de Trouw-Abstractiviteit Trade-off in Abstractive Summarisatie', 'hr': 'Verna ili ekstraktivna? O ublažavanju trgovine vjernosti i abstraktivnosti u abstraktivnom sažetku', 'id': 'Percaya atau Ekstraktif? Pada Mitigating Faithfulness-Abstractiveness Trade-off dalam Abstractive Summarization', 'de': 'Treu oder extraktiv? Zur Abschwächung des Treue-Abstraktions-Kompromisses in der abstrakten Zusammenfassung', 'ko': '충실한 거예요, 치밀한 거예요?논은 추상적 총결 중의 충실성과 추상적 균형을 경감시킨다', 'fa': 'اعتقادی یا خارجی؟ در مورد تغییر دادن تجارت اعتقادی و دقیق در جمع\u200cآوری مطلق', 'tr': 'Açmak mümkin mi? Dogruçylyk-Abstraktylyk Iňleşligi', 'sw': 'Ni mkweli au kutolewa? Kuzungumzia Kutokana na Biashara ya Uaminifu na Utafiti', 'af': 'Geloof of uitpak? Om die getrouheid-abstraktiviteit-handel af in abstraktiewe opsomming', 'sq': 'Faithful or Extractive?  Për lehtësimin e tregtisë besimi-abstraktiviteti në përmbledhjen abstraktive', 'am': 'የታመነ ወይም አውጣ ነጋዴ', 'hy': 'Հավատացի՞ կամ արտադրողի՞: Հավատարմության և առանձնահատուկ արտադրության նվազեցնելու մասին', 'az': 'Şübhəsiz ki , sadiq və ya çıxarılmış? İnanlıq-abstraktiv ticarəti Abstraktiv Toplaşdırma', 'bn': 'বিশ্বাস অথবা এক্সট্রেক্ট? আবত্ত্রিক সামারিজেশনে বিশ্বাস-আট্রাক্টিভিস্ট ব্যবসায়ীতে মিশ্রিত করার সময়', 'bs': 'Verna ili ekstraktivna? O ublažavanju trgovine vjernosti i abstraktivnosti u abstraktivnom sažetku', 'ca': 'Feu o Extractiu? En Mitigar el Compromís de Fealitat-Abstractivitat en una Resumen Abstractiva', 'cs': 'Věrný nebo extraktivní? O zmírnění kompromisu věrnosti a abstraktivity v abstraktivním shrnutí', 'et': 'Ustav või ekstraktiivne? Uskuse ja abstraktsuse kompromisse leevendamine abstraktses kokkuvõttes', 'fi': 'Uskollinen vai ekstraktiivinen? Uskollisuus-abstraktisuus-kompromissin lieventäminen tiivistelmässä', 'jv': 'profile Jejaring', 'sk': 'Zvest ali ekstraktiven? O ublažitvi kompromisa zvestobo-abstraktivnost v abstraktivnem povzetku', 'he': 'נאמן או אקסטרקטיבי? על הקלה של הסחר האמינות-אפסטרטיבית בסדרה אסטרקטיבית', 'ha': '@ action KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'བློ་གཏད་པ་དང་ཕྱིར་འདོན་བྱེད་དགོས་སམ ངེས་པར་ཐད་ཚོད་དང་ཐད་རླུང་བའི་ཚོར་ཞུགས་སྤྲོད་ནས་བསྡད་པ'}
{'en': 'Dialogue systems are usually categorized into two types, open-domain and task-oriented. The first one focuses on chatting with users and making them engage in the conversations, where selecting a proper topic to fit the dialogue context is essential for a successful dialogue. The other one focuses on a specific task instead of casual talks, e.g., finding a movie on Friday night, playing a song. These two directions have been studied separately due to their different purposes. However, how to smoothly transition from social chatting to task-oriented dialogues is important for triggering the business opportunities, and there is no any public data focusing on such scenarios. Hence, this paper focuses on investigating the conversations starting from open-domain social chatting and then gradually transitioning to task-oriented purposes, and releases a large-scale dataset with detailed annotations for encouraging this research direction. To achieve this goal, this paper proposes a framework to automatically generate many dialogues without human involvement, in which any powerful open-domain dialogue generation model can be easily leveraged. The human evaluation shows that our generated dialogue data has a natural flow at a reasonable quality, showing that our released data has a great potential of guiding future research directions and commercial activities. Furthermore, the released models allow researchers to automatically generate unlimited dialogues in the target scenarios, which can greatly benefit semi-supervised and unsupervised approaches.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من التقدم الأخير في التلخيص التجريدي ، لا تزال الأنظمة تعاني من أخطاء في الأمانة. بينما اقترح العمل السابق نماذج تعمل على تحسين الإخلاص ، فمن غير الواضح ما إذا كان التحسين يأتي من زيادة مستوى الاستخراج لمخرجات النموذج كطريقة ساذجة لتحسين الإخلاص وهي جعل نماذج التلخيص أكثر استخلاصًا. في هذا العمل ، نقدم إطارًا لتقييم الإخلاص الفعال لأنظمة التلخيص ، من خلال إنشاء منحنى مبادلة الإخلاص والتجريد الذي يعمل كعنصر تحكم في نقاط التشغيل المختلفة على الطيف التجريدي. نوضح بعد ذلك أن خط الأساس لتقدير الاحتمالية القصوى (MLE) وكذلك الطرق المقترحة مؤخرًا لتحسين الإخلاص ، تفشل في تحسين التحكم على نفس المستوى من التجريد باستمرار. أخيرًا ، نتعلم محددًا لتحديد الملخص الأكثر إخلاصًا وتجريدًا لوثيقة معينة ، ونوضح أن هذا النظام يمكن أن يحقق درجات أعلى من الإخلاص في التقييمات البشرية بينما يكون أكثر تجريدًا من النظام الأساسي في مجموعتي بيانات. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن نظامنا قادر على تحقيق مقايضة صدق - تجريدية أفضل من السيطرة على نفس المستوى من التجريدية.', 'pt': 'Apesar do progresso recente na sumarização abstrativa, os sistemas ainda sofrem com erros de fidelidade. Embora trabalhos anteriores tenham proposto modelos que melhoram a fidelidade, não está claro se a melhoria vem de um aumento do nível de extratividade das saídas do modelo, pois uma maneira ingênua de melhorar a fidelidade é tornar os modelos de sumarização mais extrativos. Neste trabalho, apresentamos um framework para avaliar a fidelidade efetiva de sistemas de sumarização, gerando uma curva de trade-off fidelidade-abstratividade que serve como controle em diferentes pontos de operação do espectro de abstração. Em seguida, mostramos que a linha de base da Estimativa de Máxima Verossimilhança (MLE), bem como os métodos recentemente propostos para melhorar a fidelidade, falham em melhorar consistentemente o controle no mesmo nível de abstração. Por fim, aprendemos um seletor para identificar o resumo mais fiel e abstrato para um determinado documento e mostramos que esse sistema pode atingir pontuações mais altas de fidelidade em avaliações humanas, sendo mais abstrativo do que o sistema de linha de base em dois conjuntos de dados. Além disso, mostramos que nosso sistema é capaz de alcançar uma melhor relação fidelidade-abstratividade do que o controle no mesmo nível de abstração.', 'es': 'A pesar de los recientes avances en la sumarización abstractiva, los sistemas siguen sufriendo errores de fidelidad. Si bien el trabajo anterior ha propuesto modelos que mejoran la fidelidad, no está claro si la mejora proviene de un mayor nivel de extractividad de los productos del modelo, ya que una forma ingenua de mejorar la fidelidad es hacer que los modelos de resumen sean más extractivos. En este trabajo, presentamos un marco para evaluar la fidelidad efectiva de los sistemas de resumen, mediante la generación de una curva de equilibrio entre fidelidad y abstractividad que sirve como control en diferentes puntos operativos del espectro de abstractividad. Luego mostramos que la línea de base de la Estimación de Máxima Verosimilitud (MLE), así como los métodos recientemente propuestos para mejorar la fidelidad, no mejoran consistentemente el control en el mismo nivel de abstractividad. Finalmente, aprendemos un selector para identificar el resumen más fiel y abstractivo de un documento dado, y mostramos que este sistema puede lograr puntuaciones de fidelidad más altas en las evaluaciones humanas, al tiempo que es más abstractivo que el sistema de referencia en dos conjuntos de datos. Además, demostramos que nuestro sistema es capaz de lograr una mejor compensación entre fidelidad y abstractividad que el control al mismo nivel de abstractividad.', 'fr': "Malgré les récents progrès de la synthèse abstraite, les systèmes souffrent encore d'erreurs de fidélité. Bien que des travaux antérieurs aient proposé des modèles qui améliorent la fidélité, on ne sait pas si cette amélioration provient d'un niveau d'extractivité accru des résultats du modèle, car une façon naïve d'améliorer la fidélité est de rendre les modèles de synthèse plus extractifs. Dans ce travail, nous présentons un cadre pour évaluer la fidélité effective des systèmes de synthèse, en générant une courbe de compromis fidélité et abstraction qui sert de contrôle à différents points de fonctionnement sur le spectre de l'abstraction. Nous montrons ensuite que la base de référence de l'estimation maximale de vraisemblance (MLE) ainsi que les méthodes récemment proposées pour améliorer la fidélité ne parviennent pas à s'améliorer de manière cohérente par rapport au contrôle au même niveau d'abstraction. Enfin, nous apprenons un sélecteur pour identifier le résumé le plus fidèle et le plus abstrait pour un document donné, et nous montrons que ce système peut atteindre des scores de fidélité plus élevés dans les évaluations humaines tout en étant plus abstrait que le système de base sur deux ensembles de données. De plus, nous montrons que notre système est capable d'obtenir un meilleur compromis entre fidélité et abstraction que le contrôle au même niveau d'abstraction.", 'zh': '虽近取进展于抽象总结,而系统犹困于忠实。 虽前事已建忠实之形,未详其所以输提取性水平者,以其天真一法使摘要更具可采性也。 凡此诸事,论总有效忠实度之框架,以成一忠实度 - 抽象性权曲线,当曲线以为抽象性谱异操。 然后明其大似然度(MLE)基线及近议增崇忠实之法,未能同抽象性终始如一。 最后,学一选择器以识给定文档最忠至抽象之摘要,明当于人伦估中得高忠实度分数,兼抽象于两集上之基线。 此外,明与同抽象级别之制,吾统得遂其忠实 - 抽象性权衡也。', 'ru': 'Несмотря на недавний прогресс в абстрактном обобщении, системы все еще страдают от ошибок верности. Хотя в предыдущей работе предлагались модели, которые улучшают верность, неясно, является ли улучшение результатом повышенного уровня извлечения результатов модели, поскольку один из наивных способов повышения верности заключается в том, чтобы сделать модели обобщения более извлекаемыми. В этой работе мы представляем структуру для оценки эффективной достоверности систем обобщения, создавая кривую компромисса верность-абстрактность, которая служит в качестве контроля в различных рабочих точках на спектре абстрактности. Затем мы показываем, что базовый уровень оценки максимального правдоподобия (MLE), а также недавно предложенные методы улучшения достоверности не позволяют последовательно улучшать контроль на том же уровне абстрактности. Наконец, мы изучаем селектор для определения наиболее достоверного и абстрактного резюме для данного документа и показываем, что эта система может достигать более высоких баллов достоверности в оценках человека, одновременно являясь более абстрактной, чем базовая система на двух наборах данных. Более того, мы показываем, что наша система способна достичь лучшего компромисса между верностью и абстрактностью, чем контроль на том же уровне абстрактности.', 'hi': 'अमूर्त सारांशीकरण में हाल की प्रगति के बावजूद, सिस्टम अभी भी वफादारी त्रुटियों से पीड़ित हैं। जबकि पहले के काम ने मॉडल प्रस्तावित किए हैं जो वफादारी में सुधार करते हैं, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि क्या सुधार मॉडल आउटपुट की निकासी के बढ़े हुए स्तर से आता है क्योंकि वफादारी में सुधार करने का एक भोला तरीका सारांशीकरण मॉडल को अधिक निष्कर्षण बनाना है। इस काम में, हम सारांशीकरण प्रणालियों की प्रभावी वफादारी का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक वफादारी-अमूर्तता व्यापार-बंद वक्र उत्पन्न करके जो अमूर्तता स्पेक्ट्रम पर विभिन्न ऑपरेटिंग बिंदुओं पर नियंत्रण के रूप में कार्य करता है। फिर हम दिखाते हैं कि अधिकतम संभावना अनुमान (एमएलई) बेसलाइन के साथ-साथ वफादारी में सुधार के लिए हाल ही में प्रस्तावित तरीके, अमूर्तता के समान स्तर पर नियंत्रण पर लगातार सुधार करने में विफल रहते हैं। अंत में, हम किसी दिए गए दस्तावेज़ के लिए सबसे वफादार और अमूर्त सारांश की पहचान करने के लिए एक चयनकर्ता सीखते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि यह प्रणाली मानव मूल्यांकन में उच्च वफादारी स्कोर प्राप्त कर सकती है, जबकि दो डेटासेट पर बेसलाइन सिस्टम की तुलना में अधिक अमूर्त है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारी प्रणाली अमूर्तता के समान स्तर पर नियंत्रण की तुलना में एक बेहतर वफादारी-अमूर्तता व्यापार-बंद प्राप्त करने में सक्षम है।', 'ja': '抽象的な要約の最近の進歩にもかかわらず、システムは依然として忠実度の誤りに苦しんでいる。 以前の研究では忠実度を向上させるモデルが提案されていましたが、忠実度を向上させるための稚拙な方法の1つとして、モデル出力の抽出性のレベルが向上したことから改善がもたらされたかどうかは不明です。 本研究では、抽象性スペクトル上の異なる動作点での制御として機能する忠実度-抽象度トレードオフ曲線を生成することにより、要約システムの有効忠実度を評価するためのフレームワークを提示する。 そして、最大尤度推定（ MLE ）ベースラインと、最近提案された忠実度を向上させる方法は、同じレベルの抽象度での対照よりも一貫して改善されないことを示した。 最後に、特定の文書の最も忠実で抽象的な要約を特定するためのセレクターを学習し、このシステムが2つのデータセットのベースラインシステムよりも抽象的でありながら、人間の評価でより高い忠実度スコアを達成できることを示します。 さらに、当社のシステムは、同じレベルの抽象性での制御よりも、より良い忠実度-抽象性のトレードオフを達成することができることを示しています。', 'ga': 'In ainneoin dul chun cinn le déanaí maidir le hachoimriú teibí, tá earráidí dílseachta fós ag baint le córais. Cé go bhfuil múnlaí molta a fheabhsaíonn dílseacht san obair a rinneadh roimhe seo, ní léir an dtagann an feabhsúchán as leibhéal méadaithe eastóscadh aschuir na samhla mar bhealach naive amháin chun dílseacht a fheabhsú is ea samhlacha achoimre a dhéanamh níos eastósctha. Sa saothar seo, cuirimid creat i láthair chun dílseacht éifeachtach na gcóras achoimriúcháin a mheas, trí chuar comhbhabhtáil dhílseachta-teibíocht a ghiniúint a fheidhmíonn mar rialú ag pointí oibriúcháin éagsúla ar an speictream teibíochta. Léirímid ansin go dteipeann ar bhunlíne an Mheastacháin um Dhóchúlacht Uasta (MLE) chomh maith leis na modhanna a moladh le déanaí chun an dílseacht a fheabhsú, an smacht a fheabhsú go comhsheasmhach ag an leibhéal céanna teibí. Ar deireadh, foghlaimímid roghnóir chun an achoimre is dílis agus is teibí a aithint do dhoiciméad ar leith, agus a thaispeáint gur féidir leis an gcóras seo scóir dhílseachta níos airde a bhaint amach i meastóireachtaí daonna agus é níos teibí ná an córas bunlíne ar dhá thacar sonraí. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go bhfuil ár gcóras in ann comhbhabhtáil níos fearr a bhaint amach ó thaobh dílseachta-teibíocht ná an rialú ar an leibhéal céanna teibíochta.', 'hu': 'Az absztraktív összefoglalás közelmúltbeli előrehaladása ellenére a rendszerek még mindig hűségi hibákkal szenvednek. Míg a korábbi munkák olyan modelleket javasoltak, amelyek javítják a hűséget, nem egyértelmű, hogy a javulás a modell kimeneteinek fokozott kitermelési szintjéből ered-e, mivel a hűség javításának egyik naiv módja az összefoglaló modellek kitermelése. Ebben a munkában bemutatjuk az összefoglaló rendszerek hatékony hűségének értékelésére szolgáló keretet, egy hűség-absztraktivitás kompromisszumos görbe létrehozásával, amely az absztraktivitás spektrum különböző működési pontjain irányításként szolgál. Ezt követően megmutatjuk, hogy a Maximális Valószínűség Becslése (MLE) alapja, valamint a közelmúltban javasolt módszerek a hűség javítására, nem képesek következetesen javítani az absztraktivitás azonos szintjén történő ellenőrzést. Végezetül megtanuljuk egy kiválasztót, amely egy adott dokumentum leghűségesebb és legabsztraktívabb összefoglalását határozza meg, és megmutatja, hogy ez a rendszer magasabb hűségi pontszámokat érhet el az emberi értékelésekben, miközben absztraktívabb, mint az alaprendszer két adathalmazon. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy rendszerünk képes jobb hűség-absztraktivitás kereskedelmet elérni, mint az absztraktivitás azonos szintjén történő irányítás.', 'ka': 'აბსტრაქტიური სიმბოლოების შესახებ, სისტემის შეცდომების შეცდომების შეცდომების გარეშე. მაგრამ წინა სამუშაო მუშაო მოდელები, რომლებიც წარმოიქმნენება სიმართლეობას უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ფრამეტრი, რომელიც აბსტრაქტიგური სპექტრემის ეფექტიური სისტემების წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც განსხვავებული მომხმარების სპექტრემის კონტროლის კონტროლის გან შემდეგ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მაქსიმალური წარმოდგენების (MLE) ფესტრიქტიური სწორედ და მხოლოდ საკუთარი წარმოდგენების მეტირები დაახლოებისთვის, არ შეუძლებელია კონტროლექტიური სწორ საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ვისწავლით მონიშნელი, რომ განვიცნოთ უფრო მჯვენიერი და აბსტრაქტიური საზოგადომენტის შესაძლებლობა და გამოჩვენოთ, რომ ეს სისტემა შეიძლება ადამიანის განსაზომილებში უფრო მეტი აბსტრაქტიურ დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემის შესაძლებელია გავაკეთოთ უფრო მეტი სიმართლე-აბსტრაქტიგური შესაძლებლობა, ვიდრე კონტროლექტიგური შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ი', 'el': 'Παρά την πρόσφατη πρόοδο στην αφηρημένη περίληψη, τα συστήματα εξακολουθούν να υποφέρουν από λάθη πιστότητας. Ενώ προηγούμενες εργασίες έχουν προτείνει μοντέλα που βελτιώνουν την πιστότητα, δεν είναι σαφές αν η βελτίωση προέρχεται από ένα αυξημένο επίπεδο εξαγωγικότητας των αποτελεσμάτων του μοντέλου καθώς ένας αφελής τρόπος βελτίωσης της πιστότητας είναι να γίνουν τα συνοπτικά μοντέλα πιο αποσπαστικά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα πλαίσιο για την αξιολόγηση της αποτελεσματικής πιστότητας των συστημάτων συνοψίας, δημιουργώντας μια καμπύλη ανταλλαγής πιστότητας-αφαιρετικότητας που χρησιμεύει ως έλεγχος σε διάφορα σημεία λειτουργίας του φάσματος αφαίρεσης. Στη συνέχεια, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η βάση υπολογισμού μέγιστης πιθανότητας (ΜΛΕ) καθώς και οι πρόσφατα προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι για τη βελτίωση της πιστότητας, δεν βελτιώνονται σταθερά έναντι του ελέγχου στο ίδιο επίπεδο αφαίρεσης. Τέλος, μαθαίνουμε έναν επιλογέα για να προσδιορίσουμε την πιο πιστή και αφηρημένη περίληψη για ένα δεδομένο έγγραφο και να δείξουμε ότι αυτό το σύστημα μπορεί να επιτύχει υψηλότερες βαθμολογίες πιστότητας σε ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις ενώ είναι πιο αφηρημένο από το σύστημα βάσης σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων. Επιπλέον, αποδεικνύουμε ότι το σύστημά μας είναι σε θέση να επιτύχει μια καλύτερη ανταλλαγή πιστότητας-αφαιρετικότητας από τον έλεγχο στο ίδιο επίπεδο αφαιρετικότητας.', 'it': "Nonostante i recenti progressi nella sintesi astratta, i sistemi soffrono ancora di errori di fedeltà. Mentre il lavoro precedente ha proposto modelli che migliorano la fedeltà, non è chiaro se il miglioramento derivi da un maggiore livello di estrattività dei modelli output in quanto un modo ingenuo per migliorare la fedeltà è quello di rendere i modelli di sintesi più estrattivi. In questo lavoro, presentiamo un framework per valutare l'effettiva fedeltà dei sistemi di sintesi, generando una curva di trade-off fedeltà-astrattezza che funge da controllo in diversi punti operativi dello spettro dell'astrattezza. Mostriamo quindi che la base di riferimento della stima della massima probabilità (MLE) così come i metodi recentemente proposti per migliorare la fedeltà, non riescono a migliorare costantemente il controllo allo stesso livello di astrazione. Infine, impariamo un selettore per identificare il riassunto più fedele e astratto per un dato documento, e mostrare che questo sistema può ottenere punteggi di fedeltà più elevati nelle valutazioni umane pur essendo più astratto del sistema di base su due set di dati. Inoltre, dimostriamo che il nostro sistema è in grado di ottenere un miglior compromesso fedeltà-astrattività rispetto al controllo allo stesso livello di astrattività.", 'lt': 'Nepaisant pastarojo meto pažangos abstraktyvioje santraukoje, sistemos vis dar kenčia nuo patikimumo klaidų. Nors ankstesniame darbe pasiūlyti modeliai, kuriais gerinamas patikimumas, neaišku, ar pagerėjimas atsiranda dėl didesnio modelio rezultatų gavybos lygio, nes vienu neiviu būdu pagerinti patikimumą yra padidinti santraukų modelių gavybą. Šiame darbe pateikiame sistemą veiksmingam santraukų sistemų patikimumui įvertinti sukuriant patikimumo ir abstraktyvumo kompromiso kreivę, kuri įvairiuose veiklos taškuose naudojama abstraktyvumo spektro kontrole. Tada parodysime, kad didžiausio tikimybės įvertinimo (MLE) bazė ir neseniai pasiūlyti patikimumo gerinimo metodai nuosekliai nepagerina kontrolės tuo pačiu abstraktumo lygiu. Galiausiai mes išmokome rinkėją nustatyti patikimiausią ir abstrakčiausią tam tikro dokumento santrauką ir parodysime, kad ši sistema gali pasiekti didesnius patikimumo rezultatus vertinant žmones, tačiau yra abstraktesnė nei bazinė sistema dviejuose duomenų rinkiniuose. Be to, mes rodome, kad mūsų sistema gali pasiekti geresnį sąžiningumo ir abstraktyvumo kompromisą nei kontrolė tuo pačiu abstraktyvumo lygiu.', 'mk': 'И покрај неодамнешниот напредок во апстрактивната резултатација, системите сé уште страдаат од грешки во верноста. Иако претходната работа предложи модели кои ја подобруваат верноста, не е јасно дали подобрувањето доаѓа од зголемено ниво на екстрактивност на излезите од моделот како еден наивен начин за подобрување на верноста е да се направи резултатот модел поекстрактивен. Во оваа работа, претставуваме рамка за проценка на ефикасната верност на системите за резултати, со генерирање на крива за размена на верност-апстрактивност која служи како контрола на различни оперативни точки на спектрот на апстрактивност. Потоа покажуваме дека базата за проценка на максималната веројатност (MLE), како и неодамна предложените методи за подобрување на верноста, не успеваат константно да се подобрат контролата на истото ниво на апстрактивност. Конечно, научивме избирач кој ќе го идентификува најверниот и апстрактивен резултат за одреден документ, и ќе покажеме дека овој систем може да постигне повисоки резултати на верност во човечките проценки, додека е поапстрактивен од основниот систем на два податоци. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека нашиот систем е способен да постигне подобра размена на верност-апстрактивност отколку контрола на исто ниво на апстрактивност.', 'ms': 'Walaupun kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam ringkasan abstraktif, sistem masih menderita kesalahan kesetiaan. Sementara kerja sebelumnya telah mengusulkan model yang meningkatkan kesetiaan, tidak jelas sama ada peningkatan berasal dari tingkat meningkatkan ekstraksi output model sebagai satu cara naif untuk meningkatkan kesetiaan adalah untuk membuat model ringkasan lebih ekstraktif. Dalam kerja ini, kami mempersembahkan kerangka untuk menilai kesetiaan efektif sistem pengringkasan, dengan menghasilkan lengkung perdagangan kesetiaan-abstraktif yang berkhidmat sebagai kawalan di titik operasi yang berbeza pada spektrum abstraktif. Kemudian kita tunjukkan bahawa dasar Estimasi Kemungkinan Maksimum (MLE) serta kaedah yang baru-baru ini diusulkan untuk memperbaiki kesetiaan, gagal memperbaiki secara konsisten at as kawalan pada tahap abstraktif yang sama. Akhirnya, kita belajar pemilih untuk mengenalpasti ringkasan yang paling setia dan abstraktif untuk dokumen tertentu, dan menunjukkan bahawa sistem ini boleh mencapai skor setia yang lebih tinggi dalam penilaian manusia sementara lebih abstraktif daripada sistem asas pada dua set data. Selain itu, kita menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita mampu mencapai perdagangan kesetiaan-abstraktif yang lebih baik daripada kawalan pada tahap abstraktif yang sama.', 'kk': 'Абстрактивтік тұжырымдамасында жаңа жағдайда қарағанда, жүйелер әлі сенімдік қателерден тұрады. Алдыңғы жұмыс істеу үлгілерін жұмыс істеу үлгілерін қолдануға арналған, үлгісінің шығару деңгейінде жұмыс істеу үлгілерін өзгертілген деңгейінен бір найтив жолы болып шығару үлгілерін жасау үлгілерін Бұл жұмыстың ішінде, бұл жұмыс ішінде, абстрактивтік спектрондың әртүрлі операциялық нүктелерінде әсер ететін жұмыс істеу жүйелердің ефективті сенімділігін оқу үшін, сенімділікті-абстрактивтік тұрат Содан кейін, максималдық ықтималдық (MLE) бағдарламасының және соңғы ұсынылған ықтималдығын жақсарту арқылы, бұл контролды бір абстрактивдік деңгейінде жақсартуға болмайды. Соңында, біз таңдаушысын келтірілген құжаттың ең сенімді және абстрактивті тұжырымдамасын анықтау үшін үйренеміз, жұмыс жүйесі адамдардың оқиғаларында тұжырымдық нәтижелерін, екі деректер қорларында негізгі жүйесінен Сонымен қатар, біз жүйеміздің бір абстрактивдік деңгейіндегі контрольдік деңгейінде сенімдік-абстрактивдік тәртібін жеткізуге болады.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d ശേഷം, വിശ്വാസത്തിന്റെ പിശകുകളില്\u200d വെച്ച് സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d അന വിശ്വാസത്തില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പണിയിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ മുന്\u200dകൂടുതല്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നത് മാതൃകയില്\u200d നിന്നും മ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ വിശ്വാസത്തെ പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെ പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള എസ്റ്റിമേഷന്\u200d (MLE) ബെസ്റ്റിലേക്കും അടുത്തുള്ള വിശ്വാസത്തിന് മുന്\u200dകൂ അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു രേഖയ്ക്ക് ഏറ്റവും വിശ്വാസിയായ വിശ്വാസിയായ വിശ്വാസിയായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d പഠിക്കുകയും, രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് വിശ്വസ്തതയില്ലാത്ത വ്യാപാരത്തിന്റെ നിയന്ത്രണത്തെക്കാള്\u200d ഉത്തമമായ വ്യവസ്ഥയെ എത്താ', 'mt': 'Minkejja l-progress reċenti fis-sommarju astrattiv, is-sistemi għadhom ibatu minn żbalji fil-fiduċja. Filwaqt li x-xogħol preċedenti ppropona mudelli li jtejbu l-fiduċja, mhuwiex ċar jekk it-titjib ġej minn livell akbar ta’ estrattività tar-riżultati tal-mudell bħala mod wieħed naïve biex tittejjeb il-fiduċja huwa li l-mudelli ta’ sommarju jsiru aktar estrattivi. F’din il-ħidma, qed nippreżentaw qafas għall-evalwazzjoni tal-fiduċja effettiva tas-sistemi ta’ sommarju, billi niġġeneraw kurva ta’ kompromess tal-fiduċja-astrattività li sservi ta’ kontroll f’punti operattivi differenti fuq l-ispettru tal-astrattività. Imbagħad nirriżultaw li l-linja bażi tal-Istima Massima tal-Probabbiltà (MLE) kif ukoll il-metodi proposti reċentement għat-titjib tal-fiduċja, jonqsu milli jtejbu b’mod konsistenti fuq il-kontroll fl-istess livell ta’ astrattività. Fl-a ħħar nett, nitgħallmu selettur biex jidentifika s-sommarju l-aktar fedeli u astrattiv għal dokument partikolari, u nuru li din is-sistema tista’ tikseb punteġġi ogħla ta’ fedeltà fl-evalwazzjonijiet tal-bniedem filwaqt li tkun aktar astrattiva mis-sistema bażi fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta. Barra minn hekk, nuru li s-sistema tagħna hija kapaċi tikseb kompromess a ħjar bejn il-fiduċja u l-astrattività mill-kontroll fl-istess livell ta’ astrattività.', 'no': 'Til tross for nyleg framgang i abstraktive sammendrag, har systemet fremdeles kjørt frå feil på godverdighet. Mens førre arbeid har foreslått modeller som forbetrar godverdighet, er det ikkje klart om forbetringa kommer frå eit økt nivå av ekstraktiviteten av modellen som ein naiv måte å forbetra godverdighet er å gjera sammendragsmodular meir ekstraktiv. I denne arbeiden presenterer vi eit rammeverk for å evaluera effektivt godverdighet av samanseringssystemet ved å laga eit uttrykk-abstraktivitetskurve som tjener som kontroll på ulike operasjonspunkt på abstraktivitetsspektrum. Vi viser derfor at den maksimale sannsynlighetslinjen (MLE) og nyleg foreslåde metodane for å forbetra sannsynligheten, kan ikkje konsekvent forbetra kontrollen på samme nivå av abstraktivitet. I slutt lærer vi eit veljar å identifisera den mest tiltrudde og abstraktive samandrag for eit gitt dokument, og viser at denne systemet kan få høgare godverdingspoeng i menneske evalueringar mens det er meir abstraktive enn baselinjesystemet på to datasett. I tillegg viser vi at systemet vårt er i stand til å oppnå ein bedre uttrykk av godverdighet og abstraktivitet enn kontrollen på samme nivå av abstraktivitet.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хугацааны хэмжээсүүд дээр саяхан хөгжлийн үр дүнд ч, систем үнэндээ итгэлтэй алдаа гарч байна. Өмнөх ажлын хувьд итгэлтэй байдлыг сайжруулах загваруудыг санал болгосон ч, сайжруулалт нь загварын үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлэх нь итгэлтэй байдлыг сайжруулах нэг жинхэнэ арга гэдэг нь илүү нэмэгдүүлэх загваруудыг илүү нэмэгдүүлэх Энэ ажлын тулд бид жишээлбэлтийн системийн үнэндээ итгэлтэй байдлыг үнэлэх хэмжээг илэрхийлж, итгэлтэй байдлын халдварлах муруй бий болгоход бусад ажиллах хэмжээсүүдийг агуулдаг. Тэгээд бид хамгийн саяхан итгэлтэй байдлыг улам сайжруулахын тулд хамгийн их боломжтой (MLE) үндсэн шугам болон саяхан санал дэвшүүлсэн арга замыг харуулж чадна. Эцэст нь, бид сонгогч суралцаж өгөгдсөн баримтын хамгийн итгэлтэй, абстрактив хэмжээсүүдийг тодорхойлж чадна. Энэ систем хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлт дээш итгэлтэй үнэлгээ хүртэл 2 өгөгдлийн сангийн суурь системээс илүү абстрактив байх боло Үүнээс ч бид систем нь ижил хэмжээнд хүрэхгүй байдлыг удирдлагаас илүү итгэлтэй, итгэлтэй байдлын худалдаа гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Pomimo ostatnich postępów w streszczeniu abstrakcyjnym systemy nadal cierpią z powodu błędów wierności. Podczas gdy wcześniejsze prace proponowały modele poprawiające wierność, nie jest jasne, czy poprawa wynika ze zwiększonego poziomu ekstrakcyjności wyników modelu, ponieważ naiwnym sposobem poprawy wierności jest uczynienie modeli podsumowujących bardziej ekstrakcyjnymi. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy ramy oceny efektywnej wierności systemów sumowania, poprzez generowanie krzywej kompromisu wierności-abstrakcyjności, która służy jako kontrola w różnych punktach operacyjnych spektrum abstrakcyjności. Następnie pokazujemy, że podstawowa ocena maksymalnej prawdopodobieństwa (MLE), jak również ostatnio proponowane metody poprawy wierności, nie są w stanie konsekwentnie ulepszać kontroli na tym samym poziomie abstrakcyjności. Na koniec uczymy się selektora, który pozwala zidentyfikować najbardziej wierne i abstrakcyjne podsumowanie danego dokumentu i pokazać, że system ten może osiągnąć wyższe punkty wierności w ocenach ludzkich, a jednocześnie jest bardziej abstrakcyjny niż system bazowy na dwóch zbiorach danych. Ponadto pokazujemy, że nasz system jest w stanie osiągnąć lepszy kompromis wierności-abstrakcyjności niż kontrola na tym samym poziomie abstrakcyjności.', 'sr': 'Uprkos nedavnom napretku u abstraktivnoj sažeti, sistemi još uvijek pate od grešaka u vernosti. Iako je pre posla predložio modele koji poboljšavaju vernost, nije jasno da li je poboljšanje došlo iz povećane nivoe ekstraktivnosti modela kao naivni način da poboljšamo vernost, je da se modeli sažete ekstraktivnije. U ovom poslu predstavljamo okvir za procjenu efikasne vernosti sustava sažetanja, stvarajući krivu za trgovinu s obećanjem vjernosti i abstraktivnosti koja služi kao kontrolu na različitim operativnim točkama spektra abstraktivnosti. Zatim pokažemo da je najveća procjena mogućnosti (MLE) početna linija, kao i nedavno predložene metode za poboljšanje vjernosti, ne uspevaju konsekventno poboljšati kontrolu na istom nivou apstraktivnosti. Konačno, naučili smo selektora da identifikuje najvjerniji i abstraktivniji sažetak za određeni dokument, i pokažemo da ovaj sistem može dobiti veći rezultat vernosti u ljudskim procenama dok je više apstraktivniji od početnog sistema na dva seta podataka. Osim toga, pokazujemo da je naš sistem u stanju da postigne bolju trgovinu vjernosti i abstraktivnosti nego kontrolu na istom nivou abstraktivnosti.', 'ro': 'În ciuda progreselor recente în rezumarea abstractivă, sistemele suferă încă de erori de fidelitate. Deși lucrările anterioare au propus modele care îmbunătățesc fidelitatea, nu este clar dacă îmbunătățirea vine de la un nivel crescut de extractivitate a rezultatelor modelului, deoarece o modalitate naivă de a îmbunătăți fidelitatea este de a face modelele de sinteză mai extractive. În această lucrare, prezentăm un cadru de evaluare a fidelității efective a sistemelor de rezumare, prin generarea unei curbe de compromis fidelitate-abstractivitate care servește drept control la diferite puncte de operare ale spectrului abstractivității. Apoi arătăm că estimarea probabilității maxime (MLE) de bază, precum și metodele propuse recent pentru îmbunătățirea fidelității, nu reușesc să îmbunătățească în mod constant controlul la același nivel de abstractivitate. În cele din urmă, învățăm un selector pentru a identifica rezumatul cel mai fidel și abstractiv pentru un anumit document și pentru a arăta că acest sistem poate obține scoruri de fidelitate mai mari în evaluările umane, fiind totodată mai abstractiv decât sistemul de bază pe două seturi de date. Mai mult decât atât, arătăm că sistemul nostru este capabil să realizeze un compromis mai bun de fidelitate-abstractivitate decât controlul la același nivel de abstractivitate.', 'si': 'අන්තිම ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය සම්පූර්ණයක් තියෙන්නේ නමුත්, පද්ධතිය තවමත් විශ්වාස වැරදිලි වලින්  මුලින් වැඩට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශ්වාස කරපු මොඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා නමුත් විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරපු විදිහට, ඒක නිර්දේශ විශ්වාස කරප මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙන්වන්නේ සම්පූර්ණ පද්ධතියේ විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස කරගන්න, විශ්වාසිතාවක්-අවස්ථාවක් ව්\u200dයාපාර ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ව අපි ඊට පස්සේ පෙන්වන්නේ විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ විශ්වාසිතාවක් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් නිසා ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහ අන්තිමේදී, අපි තෝරණකයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා දෙන්න තොරතුරු වලින් විශ්වාසිය හා නිර්භාවිත සංවිධානයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම මේ පද්ධතියේ මිනි තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය පුළුවන් විශ්වාසිත්වයක් හොඳයි විශ්වාසිත්වයක් ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ක', 'so': "Inta kastoo ay u soo dhowaadeen horumarinta aan waxtar lahayn, nidaamka weli waxay ka dhibaataysaa qaladyada aaminnimada. Inta uu horay shaqadu horay u soo jeedo modelal ah oo kordhiya aaminnimada, ma ahan in horumarinta laga soo baxo heerka la kordhiyey waxyaabaha dhaqdhaqaalaha modellka sida qaab suurad ah oo hagaajinta aaminnimada ah waa in uu ka dhigo qaababka summarinta si ka baxsan. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo bandhignaa shuruudo ku qiimeynaya aaminnimada nidaamka summarinta, taas oo ku sameynaya qalabka daacadnimo-ka-faa'iido ah oo u adeega goobaha waxqabadka oo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan dhaqdhaqaaqa aan waxtar lahayn. Markaas waxan tusnaynaa in heerka ugu badnaanta qiimaynta (MLE) iyo qaababka loo soo jeeday inay kordhiso aaminnimada ugu dambeysay, ay ku baaqan waayeen in la horumariyo kontrollka isla darajada waxyaabaha. Ugu dambaysta waxaan barnaa qof doortay si aan u aqoonsanno warqada la siiyey oo aamin ah oo aan la mid ahayn, waxaana tusnaa in nidaamkan uu gaadhi karo qiimeynta aaminnimada ee biniaadamka, iyadoo aan ahayn mid ka qaata nidaamka hoose ee labada kooban. Moreover, we show that our system is able to achieve a better faithfulness-abstractiveness trade-off than the control at the same level of abstractiveness.", 'ta': 'செயல்படாத சுருக்கத்தில் சமீபத்தில் முன்னேற்றம் இருந்தாலும், அமைப்புகள் இன்னும் நம்பிக்கையில் பிழைகளில்  முன்னால் வேலை நம்பிக்கை மேம்படுத்தும் மாதிரிகள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, மாதிரி வெளியீடுகளின் அதிக நிலையிலிருந்து மேம்படுத்தல் வெளியீடுகள் வருவது  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் சுருக்கல் அமைப்புகளின் செயல்பாட்டு நம்பிக்கையை பரிசோதிக்க ஒரு சட்டத்தை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அது வெவ்வேறு செயல்பாடு புள்ளிகளில் செயல்படுத்த பின்னர் நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் அதிகபட்ச வித்தியாசமான கணக்கீடு (MLE) அடிக்கோடு மற்றும் சமீபத்தில் நம்பிக்கை மேம்படுத்தும் முறைகளையும் அதே நிலையி இறுதியில், கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஆவணத்திற்கு மிகவும் நம்பிக்கையாகவும் மற்றும் செயல்படாத சுருக்கத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு தேர்ந்தெடுப்பாளரை கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம மேலும், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் நம்பிக்கையில் சிறந்த நம்பிக்கையை மறுத்துக் கொள்ள முடியும் என்று நம்பிக்கையை விட செய்', 'sv': 'Trots de senaste framstegen i abstraktiv sammanfattning lider systemen fortfarande av trofasthetsfel. Medan tidigare arbete har föreslagit modeller som förbättrar trofastheten, är det oklart om förbättringen kommer från en ökad extraktivitet av modellutgångarna eftersom ett naivt sätt att förbättra trofastheten är att göra sammanfattningsmodeller mer extraktivt. I detta arbete presenterar vi ett ramverk för att utvärdera den effektiva trofastheten hos sammanfattningssystem, genom att generera en trofasthet-abstraktivitet trade-off kurva som fungerar som en kontroll vid olika verksamhetspunkter på abstraktivitetsspektrumet. Vi visar sedan att Maximal Likelihood Estimation (MLE) baslinje liksom nyligen föreslagna metoder för att förbättra trofastheten, misslyckas att konsekvent förbättra kontrollen på samma nivå av abstraktivitet. Slutligen lär vi oss en väljare för att identifiera den mest trogna och abstrakta sammanfattningen för ett givet dokument, och visa att detta system kan uppnå högre trofasthetspoäng i mänskliga utvärderingar samtidigt som det är mer abstrakt än baslinjesystemet på två datauppsättningar. Dessutom visar vi att vårt system kan uppnå en bättre trofasthet-abstraktivitet kompromiss än kontroll på samma nivå av abstraktivitet.', 'ur': 'اچھی پیشرفت کی وجہ سے بھی، سیستموں کو یقین کی غلطی سے پہنچ رہی ہے. اگلے کام نے نمونڈلوں کو پیش کیا ہے جو اعتقادی کو زیادہ زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں، یہ غیر معلوم ہے کہ نمونڈلوں کے اضافہ کی زیادہ زیادہ دکھانے کی سطح سے آیا ہے کہ اعتقادی کو زیادہ زیادہ دکھانے کے لئے ایک نرم طریقہ ہے. ہم اس کام میں ایک فرمود پیش کریں گے کہ اسپرٹراکیٹ سٹم کے مطابق صاحب اعتبار کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے، ایک سفارشی-abstractivity تجارت-اوف کروی پیدا کریں جو مختلف عملیات پوینٹوں میں کنٹرول کے طور پر ہے۔ پھر ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ سب سے زیادہ احتمال احتمال (MLE) بنسلین اور اچھے طریقے سے پیش کیے گئے ہیں کہ اعتماد کی تدبیر کرنے کے لئے، ایک ہی سطح سے کنٹرول پر قائم نہیں ہوتے۔ آخر میں، ہم ایک انتخاب کرنے والے کو سیکھتے ہیں کہ ایک دکھانے کے لئے بہترین مومنوں اور آب تراکٹیوں کی تعریف پہچان سکتے ہیں، اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ سیسٹم انسان کے ارزش میں بہترین اعتباری کا اسکور پہنچ سکتا ہے جب کہ دو ڈیٹسٹ پر بنسٹ لین سیسٹم سے زیادہ آب تراکٹ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری سیستم ایک ہی سطح کی کنٹرول سے بہتر اعتماد و اعتماد کی تجارت کو پہنچا سکتی ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info Birinchi ishdan oldin ishni faqatga oshirish modellarini rivojlanishi mumkin, modelning cheksizlik darajadagi o'zgarishni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu ishda, biz qismlash tizimining muhimi ishni qiymatish uchun yetarmoqchimiz, biz faqat-abstraktlik soʻzni boshqarish qoidagi boshqaruv holatda boshqaruvchi boshqaruv qiladi. Keyin bizni ko'rsatganimiz, eng eng eng yaxshi darajada tasavvur qilish (MLE) bazasining asosiy va yaqinda yaxshi soʻzlik usullarini oshirish mumkin, bitta ishni oshirish muvaffaqiyatli bir darajada davom etishda muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi. Endi, biz bir hil hujjatning eng muammiy va avvoqiy kichkina aniqlashni o'rganamiz va bu tizim ikki maʼlumotlar tizimdagi asosiy tizimdan ko'proq faqat qiymatlariga ega bo'lishi mumkin. Ko'rsatganimiz, biz tizimmiz bir darajadagi tashkilotdan yaxshi ishonchilik, ta'sirliklik soʻzni boshqarishiga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù tiến bộ gần đây trong việc tổng hợp kinh doanh, hệ thống vẫn mắc lỗi tín ngưỡng. Trong khi việc làm trước đã đề xuất các mô hình cải thiện lòng trung thành, vẫn chưa rõ liệu cải tiến có đến từ một mức độ khai thác nhiệt độ của mô hình như một cách ngây thơ để cải thiện lòng trung thành là làm cho các mô hình tổng hợp thêm lôi cuốn. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một cơ sở để đánh giá sự trung thành của hệ thống tóm tắt, bằng cách tạo ra một đường cong giao thương dựa dựa dựa dựa vào tính trừu tượng, nó phục vụ kiểm soát tại các điểm điều hành khác nhau về quang phổ trừu tượng. Chúng tôi cho thấy cơ sở dự đoán nhiều khả năng cao nhất (MLE) cũng như những phương pháp đề xuất gần đây để cải thiện đức tin, không đạt được khả năng kiểm soát cùng mức độ trừu tượng. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi học được một chuyên gia để tìm ra một cuối sách thủ lớn nhất tin tượng và thú lớn nhất cho một phòng tài liệu chính thức, và cho biết rằng hệ thốt này có thể đạt được kỷ Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy hệ thống của chúng tôi có khả năng trao đổi tính trừu tượng tốt hơn so với việc kiểm soát cùng một mức độ trừu tượng.', 'bg': 'Въпреки скорошния напредък в абстрактното обобщаване, системите все още страдат от грешки във вярността. Въпреки че предишната работа предлага модели, които подобряват вярността, не е ясно дали подобрението идва от повишено ниво на екстрактивност на изходните модели, тъй като един наивен начин за подобряване на вярността е да се направят моделите на обобщение по-екстрактивни. В тази работа представяме рамка за оценка на ефективната вярност на системите за обобщаване чрез генериране на крива на коректност-абстрактност, която служи като контрол в различни работни точки на спектъра на абстрактност. След това показваме, че базовата база за оценка на максималната вероятност, както и наскоро предложените методи за подобряване на вярността, не успяват последователно да подобрят контрола на същото ниво на абстрактност. Накрая, научаваме селектор, който да идентифицира най-вярното и абстрактно резюме за даден документ и да покаже, че тази система може да постигне по-високи оценки за вярност при човешките оценки, като същевременно е по-абстрактна от базовата система на два набора от данни. Освен това показваме, че нашата система е в състояние да постигне по-добър компромис вярност-абстрактност от контрола на същото ниво на абстрактност.', 'hr': 'Unatoč nedavnom napretku u abstraktivnom sažetku, sustavi još uvijek pate od grešaka vjernosti. Iako je prije posla predložio modele koji poboljšavaju vjernost, nije jasno da li je poboljšanje došlo iz povećane razine ekstraktivnosti rezultata modela kao naivni način za poboljšanje vjernosti je učiniti modele sažetke ekstraktivnijim. U ovom poslu predstavljamo okvir za procjenu učinkovite vjernosti sustava sažetacije, stvarajući krivu za trgovinu vjernosti-abstraktivnosti koja služi kao kontrolu na različitim operativnim točkama spektra abstraktivnosti. Zatim pokazujemo da početna linija maximalne procjene vjerojatnosti (MLE), kao i nedavno predložene metode za poboljšanje vjernosti, ne mogu konsekventno poboljšati nad kontrolom na istoj razini apstraktivnosti. Konačno, naučili smo selektora da identificira najvjerniji i apstraktivniji sažetak za određeni dokument, i pokažemo da ovaj sustav može dobiti veće rezultate vjernosti u ljudskim procjenama dok je više apstraktivniji od početnog sustava na dva podataka. Osim toga, pokazujemo da je naš sustav u stanju postići bolju trgovinu vjernosti-abstraktivnosti nego kontrolu na istoj razini abstraktivnosti.', 'da': 'På trods af de seneste fremskridt inden for abstraktiv opsummering lider systemerne stadig af trofasthedsfejl. Mens tidligere arbejde har foreslået modeller, der forbedrer trofastheden, er det uklart, om forbedringen kommer fra et øget niveau af ekstraktivitet af model output, da en naiv måde at forbedre trofastheden på er at gøre opsummeringsmodeller mere ekstraktive. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en ramme for evaluering af den effektive trofasthed af opsummeringssystemer ved at generere en trofasthed-abstraktivitet trade-off kurve, der fungerer som kontrol på forskellige driftspunkter på abstraktivitetsspektret. Vi viser derefter, at baseline for Maximum Likelihood Estimation (MLE) samt nyligt foreslåede metoder til at forbedre trofastheden, ikke konsekvent forbedrer kontrollen på samme niveau af abstraktivitet. Endelig lærer vi en vælger til at identificere det mest trofaste og abstrakte resumé for et givet dokument, og vise, at dette system kan opnå højere trofasthedspoint i menneskelige evalueringer, samtidig med at det er mere abstrakt end basissystemet på to datasæt. Desuden viser vi, at vores system er i stand til at opnå en bedre trofasthed-abstraktivitet trade-off end kontrol på samme niveau af abstraktivitet.', 'nl': 'Ondanks recente vooruitgang in abstractieve samenvatting, hebben systemen nog steeds last van getrouwheidsfouten. Hoewel eerder werk modellen heeft voorgesteld die de getrouwheid verbeteren, is het onduidelijk of de verbetering komt uit een verhoogd niveau van extractiviteit van de modelproducten, aangezien een naïeve manier om de getrouwheid te verbeteren is om samenvattingsmodellen extractiever te maken. In dit werk presenteren we een kader voor het evalueren van de effectieve trouw van samenvattingssystemen, door het genereren van een trouw-abstractiviteit trade-off curve die dient als controle op verschillende werkpunten op het abstractiviteitsspectrum. We laten dan zien dat de Maximum Likelihood Estimation (MLE) baseline en recent voorgestelde methoden voor het verbeteren van de trouw niet consistent verbeteren ten opzichte van de controle op hetzelfde niveau van abstractiviteit. Ten slotte leren we een selector om de meest getrouwe en abstracte samenvatting voor een bepaald document te identificeren, en laten we zien dat dit systeem hogere getrouwheidsscores kan bereiken in menselijke evaluaties terwijl het abstractiever is dan het basissysteem op twee datasets. Bovendien laten we zien dat ons systeem in staat is om een betere getrouwheid-abstractiviteit compromis te bereiken dan de controle op hetzelfde niveau van abstractiviteit.', 'de': 'Trotz der jüngsten Fortschritte in der abstraktiven Zusammenfassung leiden Systeme immer noch unter Treuefehlern. Während frühere Arbeiten Modelle vorgeschlagen haben, die die Treue verbessern, ist unklar, ob die Verbesserung von einer erhöhten Extraktivität der Modellausgaben kommt, da eine naive Möglichkeit zur Verbesserung der Treue darin besteht, Zusammenfassungsmodelle extraktiver zu machen. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir einen Rahmen für die Bewertung der effektiven Treue von Zusammenfassungssystemen vor, indem wir eine Treue-Abstraktions-Trade-off-Kurve generieren, die als Kontrolle an verschiedenen Arbeitspunkten des Abstraktionsspektrums dient. Wir zeigen dann, dass sowohl die Basis der maximalen Wahrscheinlichkeitsschätzung (MLE) als auch die kürzlich vorgeschlagenen Methoden zur Verbesserung der Treue nicht in der Lage sind, die Kontrolle bei gleicher Abstraktivität konsequent zu verbessern. Schließlich lernen wir einen Selektor, um die treueste und abstrakteste Zusammenfassung für ein bestimmtes Dokument zu identifizieren, und zeigen, dass dieses System höhere Treuewerte in menschlichen Bewertungen erzielen kann, während es abstrakter ist als das Basissystem auf zwei Datensätzen. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass unser System in der Lage ist, einen besseren Treue-Abstraktions-Kompromiss zu erzielen als die Kontrolle auf gleicher Abstraktionsebene.', 'id': 'Meskipun kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam ringkasan abstraktif, sistem masih menderita kesalahan kesetiaan. Sementara pekerjaan sebelumnya telah mengusulkan model yang meningkatkan kesetiaan, tidak jelas apakah peningkatan berasal dari tingkat meningkatkan ekstraktivitas model output sebagai satu cara naif untuk meningkatkan kesetiaan adalah membuat model ringkasan lebih ekstraktif. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempersembahkan rangkaian untuk mengevaluasi kesetiaan efektif sistem ringkasan, dengan menghasilkan kurva perdagangan kesetiaan-abstraktif yang layak sebagai kontrol di titik operasi yang berbeda pada spektrum abstraktif. Kemudian kami menunjukkan bahwa dasar penghargaan Kemungkinan Maksimum (MLE) serta metode yang baru-baru ini diusulkan untuk meningkatkan kesetiaan, gagal secara konsisten meningkatkan kendali di tingkat abstraksi yang sama. Finally, we learn a selector to identify the most faithful and abstractive summary for a given document, and show that this system can attain higher faithfulness scores in human evaluations while being more abstractive than the baseline system on two datasets.  Selain itu, kita menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita mampu mencapai perdagangan setia-abstraksi yang lebih baik daripada kontrol pada tingkat abstraksi yang sama.', 'ko': '비록 최근 추상적인 총결 방면에서 약간의 진전을 거두었지만, 시스템에는 여전히 충실성 오류가 존재한다.이전의 작업에서 충실도를 높이는 모델을 제시했지만 이러한 개선이 모델 출력의 추출 정도에서 비롯된 것인지 모르겠다. 충실도를 높이는 간단한 방법은 요약모델을 더욱 추출하는 것이기 때문이다.이 작업에서 우리는 요약 시스템의 효과적인 충실성을 평가하는 구조를 제시했다. 충실성-추상적 절충곡선을 생성함으로써 추상적 스펙트럼에 있어 서로 다른 조작점의 통제로 삼았다.그리고 우리는 최대 유사 추정(MLE) 기선과 최근에 제기된 신뢰도를 높이는 방법이 같은 추상적 수준에서 통제를 지속적으로 개선할 수 없다는 것을 증명했다.마지막으로 우리는 주어진 문서에 대한 가장 충실하고 추상적인 요약을 식별하는 선택기를 배웠고 이 시스템은 인류 평가에서 더욱 높은 충실도 점수를 얻을 수 있으며 두 데이터 집합에서 기선 시스템보다 추상적이라는 것을 나타냈다.그 밖에 우리는 같은 추상적 수준에서 우리의 시스템은 통제보다 더 좋은 충실성과 추상적 균형을 실현할 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'با وجود پیشرفت اخیر در جمع\u200cآوری abstractive، سیستم\u200cها هنوز از اشتباه\u200cهای اعتماد رنج می\u200cبرند. در حالی که کار پیش از این مدل\u200cها پیشنهاد داده\u200cاند که اعتماد را بهتر می\u200cکند، مشخص نیست آیا توسعه از سطح افزایش فعالیت از نتیجه\u200cهای مدل به عنوان یک راهی نابینا برای بهتر کردن اعتماد، مدل\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری بیشتر خارج\u200cتر می\u200cشود. در این کار، ما یک چهارچوب برای ارزیابی قابلیت اعتماد سیستم\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری موثر را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، با تولید یک کره\u200cای از تجارت اعتماد و اعتماد اعتماد، که به عنوان کنترل در نقطه\u200cهای عملیات مختلف در چهارچوب abstractivity خدمت می\u200cکند. سپس نشان می دهیم که بالاترین ارزیابی احتمالات احتمالات احتمالات (MLE) و روش های اخیر پیشنهاد برای بهتر کردن اعتماد، شکست خورده است که در یک سطح کنترل در یک سطح تحقیق کنند. بالاخره، ما یک انتخابات یاد می گیریم تا بهترین جمعیت اعتماد و abstractive را برای یک سند داده شناسایی کند، و نشان می دهیم که این سیستم می تواند امتیاز اعتماد بالاتر در ارزیابی انسان را در حالی که بیشتر از سیستم پایین در دو مجموعه داده باشد. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که سیستم ما قادر است که یک تجارت بیشتری از کنترل در یک سطح آب\u200cتراکتیبی را به دست آورد.', 'tr': 'Gowy Abstraktiw jemgyýetinde öňki ýetişine ýöne, sistemalar heniz hem ynamlyk ýalňyşlyklardan çykýar. Öň işden öňki nusgalary diýilişligi geliştirmek üçin nusgalary taýýarlapdy bolsa, nusgalaryň ýokarylyk ýokarylyk ýokarynda bir döwürlenmegi diýmek üçin düýilişligi geliştirmekdir. Bu işde, sumatlandyrma sistemalarynyň etkinlik dogruçylygyny barlamak üçin bir çerçew görkeýäris. Hakykatlyk-abstraktiwnlik spektrumyň farklı operasyon noktalarynda bir kontrol edilen çykarylyk döredip. Soňra, biz iň kop sanat sanatynyň (MLE) üýtgetmesi we iň soňky teklip eden çyzgylygy geliştirmek üçin üýtgetmeli döwletleri üýtgetmeýäris. Soňunda, biz bir sened üçin iň ynamly we abstraktiwny hasaplamak üçin saýlawçy öwrenip, we bu sistemiň adamlaryň deňlenmelerinde ynamlylyk hasaplaryna ýetip biljekdigini görkez we bu sistemiň iki dataseterde boýunça sistemden has hem abstraktiwny bolup biljekdigini görkez. Munuň ýagdaýynda, sistemamyzyň abstraktiwit derejesinden has gowy bir ynamlylyk-abstraktiwit taýýarlanmagy başarmagy başaraýandygyny görkezýäris.', 'sw': 'Pamoja na maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika muhtasari usio na maana, mifumo bado yanakabiliwa na makosa ya uaminifu. Wakati kazi ya kabla imependekeza mifano ya kuboresha imani, haijajulikana kama maendeleo yanatokana na kiwango cha kuongezeka kwa ukosefu wa matumizi ya modeli kama njia moja ya kuboresha imani ni kufanya mifano ya muhtasari zaidi ya kutosha. Katika kazi hii, tunaweka mfumo wa kutathmini ukweli wa ufanisi wa mfumo wa muhtasari, kwa kutengeneza kizuizi cha uaminifu-ukosefu wa kibiashara unaotumika kama udhibiti katika pointi tofauti za upasuaji juu ya mtazamo wa kutokuwepo na utulivu. Kisha tunaonyesha kuwa msingi wa Ubaguzi wa Hesabu (MLE) wa kiwango kikubwa pamoja na mbinu zilizopendekezwa hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya kuboresha imani, kushindwa kuboresha udhibiti juu ya udhibiti wa kiwango hicho cha kutokuwepo na imani. Mwisho, tunajifunza mteuzi wa kutambua muhtasari wa kuaminika zaidi na kujitegemea kwa ajili ya nyaraka zilizopewa, na kuonyesha kwamba mfumo huu unaweza kufikia vipimo vya uaminifu zaidi katika tathmini za binadamu wakati wa kuwa tofauti zaidi ya mfumo wa msingi wa taarifa mbili. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kwamba mfumo wetu unaweza kupata biashara bora ya uaminifu na kutokuwepo na imani kuliko udhibiti wa kiwango hicho cha uongozi.', 'af': "Onthou onlangse vordering in abstraktiewe opsomming, stelsels lyk nog steeds van getroudheid foute. Alhoewel voorheede werk voorgestel het modele wat getrouheid verbeter het, is dit onbekend of die verbetering van 'n grootgemaakte vlak van uitpakkings van die model as een naive manier om getrouheid te verbeter is om opsommingsmodele meer uitpaktiveer te maak. In hierdie werk stel ons 'n raamwerk voor die evaluering van die effektief getrouheid van opsomming stelsels deur 'n getrouheid-abstraktiviteit-verhandeling-af kurve genereer wat as 'n beheer dien op verskillende operasie punte op die abstraktiviteit spektrum. Ons wys dan dat die Maksimum Likelihood-Estimation (MLE) basisline en onlangs voorgestelde metodes vir die verbetering van geloofheid, misluk om te konsistentlik verbeter oor die beheer op dieselfde vlak van abstraktiwiteit. Eindelik, ons leer 'n kieser om die mees gelowige en abstraktiewe opsomming te identifiseer vir 'n gegewe dokument, en wys dat hierdie stelsel hoogheid gelowige opsommings in menslike evaluasies kan bereik terwyl meer abstraktiewe is as die basisline stelsel op twee datastelle. Ook, ons wys dat ons stelsel kan 'n beter getrouheid-abstraktiviteit-afhandel bereik as die beheer op dieselfde vlak van abstraktiviteit.", 'sq': 'Megjithë përparimin e fundit në përmbledhjen abstrakte, sistemet ende vuajnë nga gabimet e besnikërisë. Ndërsa puna e mëparshme ka propozuar modele që përmirësojnë besnikërinë, nuk është e qartë nëse përmirësimi vjen nga një nivel i rritur i nxjerrjes së rezultateve të model it si një mënyrë naive për të përmirësuar besnikërinë është të bësh modelet e përmbledhjes më ekstraktive. Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një kuadër për vlerësimin e besnikërisë efektive të sistemeve të përmbledhjes, duke krijuar një kurvë kompensimi për besnikërinë-abstraktivitetin që shërben si një kontroll në pika të ndryshme operacionale në spektrin abstraktiv. Pastaj tregojmë se baza e vlerësimit maksimal të mundësisë (MLE) si dhe metodat e propozuara kohët e fundit për përmirësimin e besnikërisë, nuk përmirësojnë vazhdimisht kontrollin në të njëjtin nivel abstraktiviteti. Më në fund, mësojmë një zgjedhës për të identifikuar përmbledhjen më të besueshme dhe abstraktive për një dokument të caktuar dhe tregojmë se ky sistem mund të arrijë rezultate më të larta besnikërie në vlerësimet njerëzore ndërsa të jetë më abstrakt se sistemi bazë në dy grupe të dhënash. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se sistemi ynë është në gjendje të arrijë një kompromis më të mirë besnikëri-abstraktiviteti se kontrolli në të njëjtin nivel abstraktiviteti.', 'am': 'Despite recent progress in abstractive summarization, systems still suffer from faithfulness errors.  የቀድሞው ስራ እምነትን የሚያሳድግ ምሳሌዎች ሲሰልፍ፣ ማስታወቂያው የሞዴል አካባቢ የውጤት አካባቢ ውጤት ከሆነ እና እውነተኛነትን ለማሻበር አንዲት ንካራ መንገድ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የጥያቄ ስርዓት አካባቢነት ማረጋገጥ ፍሬም እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የደረጃ ስህተት መቆጣጠር (MLE) እና በቅርብ ዘመን እምነትን ለማድረግ በተዘጋጀ ሥርዓት በይነመረብ ክፍተት በክፍለ ስርዓት ላይ ማሻሻል አይቻልም፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ የታመነ እና የተለየ ሰነድ አቅራቢያ እንዲታወቅ ምርጫ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ደግሞም እናሳያቸዋለን የሥርዓት ክፍል ከሥልጣናት ይልቅ የሚሻለውን እምነትና የራቁትን ንግድ ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Չնայած վերջին առաջընթացին վերացական համառոտագրության մեջ, համակարգերը դեռևս կրում են հավատարմության սխալներից: Մինչդեռ նախորդ աշխատանքը առաջարկել է հավատարմությունը բարելավելու մոդելներ, անհասկանալի է, թե արդյոք բարելավումը գալիս է մոդելի արդյունքների առավելագույն արտադրողականության մակարդակից, որպես հավատարմությունը բարելավելու միակ անհեթեթ միջոց է համառոտագրման մոդե Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք համառոտագրման համակարգերի արդյունավետ հավատարմության գնահատման մի շրջանակ, ստեղծելով հավատարմության-վերացրատիվության փոխարկման կոր, որը ծառայում է որպես վերահսկողություն վերացրատիվության սպեկտրի տարբեր գործողական կետերում: Այնուհետև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ Մաքսիմալ հավանականության գնահատման (MLE) հիմքը, ինչպես նաև վերջերս առաջարկված մեթոդները հավատարմության բարելավման համար, չեն կարողանում մշտապես բարելավել վերահսկողությունը վերացական նույն մակարդակում: Վերջապես, մենք սովորում ենք ընտրողին, որպեսզի բացահայտենք որոշ փաստաթղթի ամենահավատ և վերացական համառոտագրությունը, և ցույց տանք, որ այս համակարգը կարող է հասնել մարդկային գնահատումների մեջ ավելի բարձր հավատարմության գնահատման արդյունքներ, մինչդեռ ավելի վերացական է, քան երկու տվյալների հի Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը կարողանում է ավելի լավ հավատարմություն-վերացրատիվություն փոխանակել, քան վերահսկողությունը վերացրատիվության նույն մակարդակում:', 'az': 'Əzabtraktif təmizlənməsinin son tədbirinə rağmen, sistemlər hələ də sadiqlik xətalarından çəkilir. Əvvəlki işin sadiqliyi yaxşılaşdıran modelləri təbliğ etmişdir, çünki düzəltmə modellərin yüksək səviyyətindən istifadə edilməsi sadiqliyi yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün bir növ yol olaraq modelləri daha yaxşılaşdırmaqdır. Bu işlərdə, qeyd sistemlərin etkili sadiqliyini değerləşdirmək üçün bir çerçive göstəririk, abstraktiv spektrumunun fərqli işlətmə noktalarında müxtəlif bir kontrol olaraq, sadiqliyyat-abstraktiv ticarətdən istifadə edərək. Sonra göstəririk ki, Maximum Likelihood Estimation (MLE) səviyyəsi və son zamanlarda təklif edilmiş tərzlərin sadiqliyi yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün, həmişə də istifadə edilən abstraktiv səviyyəsində kontrol üstündə daha yaxşılaşdırılmaz. Sonunda, biz seçənçiyi təsdiqləyici və abstraktiv bir dəstə üçün ən mömin və abstraktiv istifadə etmək üçün öyrənirik, və bu sistemin insan değerlendirmələrində daha yüksək inanıllıq nəticələrinə nail ola biləcəyini göstərək, bu sistemin iki verilən qurğudan daha abstraktiv olaraq. Daha sonra, sistemimizin istifadə edilməsindən daha yaxşı bir inanlıq-abstraktif ticarət edə biləcəyini göstəririk.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক সংক্ষেপের অগ্রগতি সত্ত্বেও, ব্যবস্থা বিশ্বাসের ভুল থেকে এখনও ভুগছে। যদিও এর আগে কাজের মডেল প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে যারা বিশ্বাস উন্নতি প্রদান করে, এটা পরিষ্কার নয় যে মডেলের উন্নতি বৃদ্ধি পাওয়া যায় কিনা তারা বিশ্বাস স্থাপনের একটি নাইভ উপায় হিস এই কাজে আমরা একটি কার্যক্রম উপস্থাপন করি সারসংক্ষেপের কার্যকর বিশ্বাসের বিশ্বাস মূল্যায়নের জন্য, একটি বিশ্বাস-অক্ষরিত বাণিজ্য-আটকানো কার্ভ তৈরি করে যা বিভিন্ন অপ তারপর আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে সর্বোচ্চ সম্ভাবনার বেসাইমেশন (এমএল) এবং সম্প্রতি বিশ্বাস সৃষ্টি করার প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি, একই স্তরে নিয়ন্ত্রণের ব্যর্থ হয়েছে। অবশেষে, আমরা একজন নির্বাচনী শিখতে পারি একটি প্রদত্ত নথির জন্য সবচেয়ে বিশ্বাসী এবং অস্বীকৃতিক সার্গার চিহ্নিত করতে, আর দেখাতে পারি যে এই সিস্টেম ম মানুষের মূল্যের এছাড়াও আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের সিস্টেম বিশ্বাস-আত্মবিশ্বাস-ব্যবসায়ীত্ব ব্যবসায়ীরা একই স্তরে নিয়ন্ত্রণের চেয়ে ভালো ক', 'bs': 'Uprkos nedavnom napretku u abstraktivnom sažetku, sistemi još uvijek pate od grešaka u vjernosti. Iako je prije posla predložio modele koji poboljšavaju vjernost, nije jasno da li je poboljšanje došlo iz povećane nivoe ekstraktivnosti rezultata modela kao naivni način da poboljšamo vjernost je učiniti modele summarizacije ekstraktivnijim. U ovom poslu predstavljamo okvir za procjenu efikasne vjernosti sustava sažetacije, stvarajući krivu za trgovinu vjernosti-abstraktivnosti koja služi kao kontrolu na različitim operativnim točkama spektra abstraktivnosti. Zatim pokazujemo da početna linija Maximum Likelihood procjene (MLE), kao i nedavno predložene metode za poboljšanje vjernosti, nisu konsekventno poboljšali kontrolu na istom nivou abstraktivnosti. Konačno, naučimo selektora da identificira najvjerniji i apstraktivniji sažetak za određeni dokument, i pokažemo da ovaj sistem može postići veći rezultati vjernosti u ljudskim procjenama dok je više apstraktivniji od početnog sistema na dva seta podataka. Osim toga, pokazujemo da je naš sistem u stanju postići bolju trgovinu vjernosti-abstraktivnosti od kontrole na istom nivou abstraktivnosti.', 'cs': 'Navzdory nedávnému pokroku v abstraktivní shrnutí trpí systémy chybami věrnosti. Zatímco předchozí práce navrhla modely, které zlepšují věrnost, není jasné, zda zlepšení pochází ze zvýšené úrovně extraktivity modelových výstupů, protože naivním způsobem zlepšení věrnosti je zvýšení extraktivity souhrnných modelů. V této práci představujeme rámec pro hodnocení efektivní věrnosti souhrnných systémů vytvořením křivky kompromisu věrnosti-abstraktivity, která slouží jako kontrola v různých operačních bodech spektra abstraktivity. Následně ukazujeme, že základní hodnota odhadu maximální pravděpodobnosti (MLE) a nedávno navržené metody pro zlepšení věrnosti nedokážou důsledně zlepšovat kontrolu na stejné úrovni abstraktivity. Nakonec se naučíme selektor identifikovat nejvěrnější a abstraktivní shrnutí daného dokumentu a ukázat, že tento systém může dosáhnout vyššího skóre věrnosti v lidských hodnoceních a zároveň je abstraktivnější než základní systém na dvou datových sadách. Navíc ukazujeme, že náš systém je schopen dosáhnout lepšího kompromisu věrnosti-abstraktivity než kontrola při stejné úrovni abstraktivity.', 'ca': "Malgrat els progrés recents en la resumida abstracta, els sistemes encara pateixen errors de fidelitat. Mentre que la feina anterior ha proposat models que milloren la fidelitat, no és clar si la millora prové d'un nivell augmentat d'extractivitat dels productes del model com una manera naiva de millorar la fidelitat és fer els models de resum més extractius. En aquesta feina, presentem un marc per avaluar la fidelitat efectiva dels sistemes de resum generant una corba de compensació de fidelitat-abstractivitat que serveix de control en diferents punts operatius en l'espectre de abstractivitat. Ens demostram que la base de la estimació de la probabilitat màxima (MLE) i els mètodes proposats recentment per millorar la fidelitat, no poden millorar constantment el control al mateix nivell d'abstracció. Finalment, aprenem a identificar un selector el resum més fiel i abstractiu d'un document, i demostram que aquest sistema pot aconseguir puntuacions més elevats de fidelitat en les evaluacions humanes mentre que és més abstractiu que el sistema de base en dos conjunts de dades. A més, demostram que el nostre sistema és capaç d'aconseguir un compromís millor de fidelitat-abstractivitat que el control al mateix nivell d'abstractivitat.", 'et': 'Vaatamata hiljutistele edusammudele abstraktses kokkuvõttes kannatavad süsteemid ikka veel truudusvigade all. Kuigi varasemates töödes on välja pakutud mudeleid, mis parandavad ustavust, on ebaselge, kas paranemine tuleneb mudeli väljundite suuremast ekstraheeruvusest, kuna üks naiivne viis ustavuse parandamiseks on teha kokkuvõtlusmudelid ekstraheerivamaks. Käesolevas töös esitame raamistiku kokkuvõtlussüsteemide tõhusa ustavuse hindamiseks, genereerides ustavuse-abstraktsuse kompromisskõvera, mis toimib kontrollina abstraktsuse spektri erinevates tööpunktides. Seejärel näitame, et maksimaalse tõenäosuse hindamise baas ja hiljuti väljapakutud meetodid ustavuse parandamiseks ei suuda järjepidevalt parandada kontrolli samal abstraktsuse tasemel. Lõpuks õpime valijat, et määrata kindlaks konkreetse dokumendi kõige ustavamad ja abstraktsemad kokkuvõtted ning näidata, et see süsteem suudab saavutada kõrgemad ustavuskoorid inimhinnangutes, olles samas abstraktsem kui baassüsteem kahel andmekogumil. Lisaks näitame, et meie süsteem suudab saavutada parema ustavuse-abstraktsuse kompromisse kui kontroll samal abstraktsuse tasemel.', 'fi': 'Huolimatta viimeaikaisesta edistyksestä abstraktiivisessa yhteenvedossa järjestelmät kärsivät edelleen uskollisuusvirheistä. Vaikka aiemmissa tutkimuksissa on ehdotettu malleja, jotka parantavat uskollisuutta, on epäselvää, tuleeko parannus mallituotosten ekstraktivuuden lisääntymisestä, koska yksi naiivi tapa parantaa uskollisuutta on tehdä yhteenvetomalleista ekstraktivempia. Tässä työssä esitellään viitekehys yhteenvetojärjestelmien tehokkaan uskollisuuden arvioimiseksi luomalla uskollisuus-abstraktiivisuus trade-off-käyrä, joka toimii kontrollina abstraktiivisuusspektrin eri toimintapisteissä. Tämän jälkeen osoitamme, että maksimaalisen todennäköisyyden estimaation (MLE) lähtötilanne sekä äskettäin ehdotetut menetelmät uskollisuuden parantamiseksi eivät jatkuvasti parane kontrolliin nähden samalla abstraktiivisuuden tasolla. Lopuksi opimme valitsimen tunnistamaan uskollisimman ja abstraktivimman yhteenvedon tietylle asiakirjalle ja osoittamaan, että tämä järjestelmä voi saavuttaa korkeammat uskollisuuspisteet ihmisten arvioinneissa samalla, kun se on abstraktisempi kuin perusjärjestelmä kahdessa aineistossa. Lisäksi osoitamme, että järjestelmämme pystyy saavuttamaan paremman uskollisuuden ja abstraktisuuden kompromissin kuin kontrollin samalla abstraktisuuden tasolla.', 'jv': 'Gak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk perusahaan nggawe ing resmi apakno, sistem kang isih durung sa gawe barang nggawe. Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk ar챕w챕 nggawe model sing luwih ng챕w챕 kuwi kesempatan, kuwi dianggawe barang ng챕w챕 kuwi mau sing luwih apik dh챕w챕, lak ngono ng챕w챕 kuwi model sing bisa dianggap sampek kudu ng챕w챕, winih dh챕w챕 kuwi nggawe kesempatan akeh dumadhi. Nang negori iki, kita nggawe sistem kanggo nggawe barang nggawe aturan sing perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan nggawe sistem sing nyimpen Awak dh챕w챕 챕nong ngomong nik Awak dh챕w챕, 챕w챕 iso nggawe aksi perusahaan 챕w챕 gak nggawe kesempatan, kuwi iso nggawe ngubah urip bantuan ngono kuwi nggawe nguasai perusahaan. Sokake, awak dh챕w챕 ngerti sewulang kanggo nambah sing beraksi lan alam sing gak bakal terus nggawe dokumen sing nyimpen, lan ngerti sistem iki iso teka dh챕w챕 sing gak dh챕w챕 bakal sing bakal terus teka-teka sing luwih apik dh챕w챕, sampek iso dianggap sistem sing beraksi iki dataset iki dadi. Nanging, awake dhewe ngerti sistem punika dipunang챕 awak dh챕w챕 sing luwih apik, nik awak dh챕w챕 kuwi kesempatan kanggo kuwi nggawe barang langgar.', 'sk': 'Kljub nedavnemu napredku pri abstraktivnem povzemanju sistemov še vedno trpijo zaradi napak v zvestobi. Medtem ko so predhodno delo predlagali modele, ki izboljšujejo zvestobo, ni jasno, ali izboljšanje izhaja iz povečane ravni ekstraktivnosti rezultatov modela, saj je en naiven način izboljšanja zvestobe narediti povzetek modelov bolj ekstraktivnih. V tem delu predstavljamo okvir za ocenjevanje učinkovite zvestobe sistemov povzetkov z ustvarjanjem krivulje kompromisa zvestobe-abstraktivnosti, ki služi kot nadzor na različnih delovnih točkah spektra abstraktivnosti. Nato pokažemo, da izhodiščna ocena največje verjetnosti (MLE) in nedavno predlagane metode za izboljšanje zvestobe ne morejo dosledno izboljšati nadzora nad enako stopnjo abstraktivnosti. Na koncu se naučimo izbirnika, ki prepozna najbolj zvest in abstraktiven povzetek za določen dokument, in pokažemo, da lahko ta sistem doseže višje ocene zvestobe pri človeških ocenah, hkrati pa je bolj abstraktiven kot osnovni sistem na dveh naborih podatkov. Poleg tega pokažemo, da je naš sistem sposoben doseči boljši kompromis zvestobe-abstraktivnosti kot nadzor na isti ravni abstraktivnosti.', 'ha': "Bayan da takwarar da aka ƙara cikin tsari na kanrakati, na'ura na ƙara suna cikin ɓatiɗun gaskiyar. A lokacin da ya gabatar da aikin na buƙata misãlai wanda ya improve gaskiyar gaskiyar, ba ya kasancẽwa idan gyãra ta zo daga an ƙara daraja na fizge matsayin misalin ayuka kamar hanyar guda ya gyara gaskiyar gaskiyar ni'ani ne ya sami misãlai masu ƙaranci. Daga wannan aikin, Munã halatar da wani firam dõmin ka evaluate aminci na'urar muhimmanci, a ƙiƙira wani runnin faƙĩri-da-kanrakati-na'ura wanda ke serva kamar wata mamlaka a cikin pointi dabam-na'ura kan kandamta. We then show that the Maximum Likelihood Estimation (MLE) baseline as well as recently proposed methods for improving faithfulness, fail to consistently improve over the control at the same level of abstractiveness.  Haƙĩƙa, za mu sanar wani mai zãɓo dõmin ka gane masu tsari masu ĩmãni da kuma masu kanana wa takardar da aka bã su, kuma mu nuna cewa wannan na'ura yana iya ƙaranci ga aminci a cikin qiimar mutane a lokacin da za'a sami masu kanana da tsarin danaslin biyu. Kayya, Munã nũna cewa ma'anarmu zai iya sãmu mafiya alhẽri ga faƙĩri-da-kando daga cinikin sami daraja na kanzuta.", 'he': 'למרות התקדמות האחרונה בסכם אוסטרקטיבי, מערכות עדיין סובלות משגיאות נאמנות. בעוד העבודה הקודמת הציעה דוגמנים שמשפכים את נאמנות, לא ברור אם השיפור מגיע מרמה גבוהה של חיפוש של תוצאות הדוגמנים כדרך נאמית אחת לשפר נאמנות היא להפוך דוגמנים של סאמריזציה יותר חיפושיים. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציגים מסגרת להערכה את האמונה היעילה של מערכות המסכם, על ידי ליצור קרב הסחר נאמנות-אוסטרקטיביות שמשרת כשליטה בנקודות פעילות שונות על ספקטרום האסטרקטיביות. ואז אנחנו מראים שהערכת הסיכוי המקסימלי (Maximum likelihood Estimation - MLE) בסיסית, כמו גם שיטות הציעו לאחרונה לשפר נאמנות, לא משתפרים באופן קבוע על השליטה באותו רמה של אוסטרקטיבות. Finally, we learn a selector to identify the most faithful and abstractive summary for a given document, and show that this system can attain higher faithfulness scores in human evaluations while being more abstractive than the baseline system on two datasets.  חוץ מזה, אנו מראים שהמערכת שלנו מסוגלת להשיג סחר נאמנות-אוסטרקטיביות טוב יותר מאשר השליטה באותו רמה של אוסטרקטיבות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པར་དུ་ཚུལ་མཇུག་བསྡུ་བའི་འཕེལ་རིམ་དུས་ང་ཚོས་ཡིད་རྟོན་ནུས་མེད་པར། སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིད་ཚད་ལེགས་རུ་གཏོང་བ་མིན་ནའང་མ་ཟད། In this work, we present a framework for evaluating the effective faithfulness of summarization systems, by generating a faithfulness-abstractiveness trade-off curve that serves as a control at different operating points on the abstractiveness spectrum. འུ་ཚོས་གཟུགས་རིས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཚད་ལྡན་མཐའ་མ་ཡིན་པས། ཡིད་རྟོན་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཉེ་ཆར་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོས་འདེམས་པའི་ཞིག་དམ་པ་དེ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་དང་མི་རྣམས་པས་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡུལ་ཡིན་པའི་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་བདེ་ལེན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྙེད་སྡུད་འདི་ལས་ཐད་ཚོར་རྣམས་ལས་ཕར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཅིག་གི་ཚད་ལ་ཚད་གཅིག་ལས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་ཤར་'}
{'en': '', 'pt': 'Slangvolution: {A} Análise Causal de Mudança Semântica e Dinâmica de Frequência em Gíria', 'ar': 'Slangvolution: {A} التحليل السببي للتغيير الدلالي وديناميكيات التردد في العامية', 'es': 'Slangvolution: {A} Análisis causal del cambio semántico y la dinámica de frecuencia en jerga', 'fr': 'Slangvolution\xa0: {A} Analyse causale du changement sémantique et de la dynamique des fréquences en argot', 'ja': 'スラング変換：{ A}スラングにおける意味変化と周波数ダイナミクスの原因分析', 'zh': '俚语卷积曰:{A} 俚语语义变化,数动之因也', 'ru': 'Slangvolution: {A} Причинный анализ семантических изменений и частотной динамики в сленге', 'hi': 'Slangvolution: {A} स्लैंग में सिमेंटिक परिवर्तन और आवृत्ति गतिशीलता का कारण विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Slangvolution: {A} Anailís Cúiseach ar Athrú Séimeantach agus Dinimic Minicíochta i Slang', 'el': '[Α} Αιτιολογική ανάλυση της σημασματικής αλλαγής και της δυναμικής συχνότητας στο Σλανγκ', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Slangvolution: {A} Szemantikus változás és frekvenciadinamika okai elemzése Slangban', 'it': 'Slangvolution: {A} Analisi causale del cambiamento semantico e della dinamica di frequenza nello Slang', 'kk': 'Slangvolution: {A} Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'lt': 'Slangvolution: {A} Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'mk': 'Слангволуција: {A} Причинска анализа на семантичката промена и фреквентна динамика во сланг', 'ms': 'Slangvolution: {A} Analisis Sebab Perubahan Semantik dan Dinamik Frekuensi dalam Slang', 'ml': 'സ്ലാങ്ങ്\u200cവോള്\u200dഷന്\u200d: {A} സെമാന്റിക് മാറ്റങ്ങളും ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസി ഡിയാനിമിക്സുകളും', 'mt': 'Slangvolution: {A} Analiżi Kawżali tal-Bidla Semantika u d-Dinamika tal-Frekwenza fil-Slang', 'mn': 'Slangvolution: {A} Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'no': 'Slangvolution: {A} Avbrytingsanalyse av semiantiske endringar og frekvensdynamikk i slang', 'pl': '{A} Analiza przyczynowa zmian semantycznych i dynamiki częstotliwości w Slangu', 'ro': 'Slangvolution: {A} Analiza cauzală a schimbărilor semantice și dinamicii frecvenței în Slang', 'sr': 'Slangvolucija: {A} Analiza prekida semantičke promene i dinamike frekvencije u slang', 'so': 'Bangla volume: {A} Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'sv': 'Slangvolution: {A} Orsasanalys av semantisk förändring och frekvensdynamik i Slang', 'ta': 'Slangvolution: {A} Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'si': 'SlangVoltion: {A} සෙමැන්ටික් වෙනස් සහ සාමාන්තික විශ්ලේෂණය ස්ලේන්ග් වල සිද්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය', 'ur': 'Slangvolution: {A} Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'uz': "Boʻsh joy: {A} Slaydda foydalanuvchi oʻzgarishlar va freym dynamics' dan foydalanish", 'vi': 'Độ kích thích (A) Phân tích nhân quả của biến đổi và tần số trung thành', 'da': 'Slangvolution: {A} Årsagsanalyse af semantisk ændring og frekvensdynamik i Slang', 'hr': 'Slangvolucija: {A} Analiza optužnice semantičke promjene i dinamike učestalosti u slang', 'bg': '{A} Причинен анализ на семантичната промяна и честотната динамика в шланга', 'nl': '[A} Causale Analyse van Semantische Verandering en Frequentiedynamiek in Slang', 'de': '{A} Kausale Analyse semantischer Veränderungen und Frequenzdynamik in Slang', 'id': 'Slangvolusi: {A} Analisi penyebab Perubahan Semantik dan Dinamika Frekuensi dalam Slang', 'fa': 'Slangvolution: {A} Analyze Causal of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'ko': '비속어 해결 방안: {A} 비속어의 의미 변화와 주파수 동태의 인과 분석', 'sw': 'Volume: {A} Uchambuzi wa Usalama wa Mabadiliko ya Semantic and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'af': 'Slangvolusie: {A} Keuse Analyseer van Semantiese Verandering en Frekwensie Dinamiek in Slang', 'tr': 'Slangvolution: {A} Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'sq': 'Slangvolution: {A} Analizë shkake e ndryshimit Semantik dhe dinamikës së frekuencës në Slang', 'am': 'volume: {A} Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'hy': 'Սլենգվոլուցիա: {A}Սլենգ սեմատիկ փոփոխության և հաճախականության դինամիկայի պատճառի վերլուծություն', 'az': 'Slangvolution: {A} Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics', 'bn': 'স্ল্যাংভলেশন: {A} সেম্যান্টিক পরিবর্তন এবং ফ্রেন্সি ডাইনামিক্সের ক্যাসাল বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'Slangvolucija: {A} Analiza prekida semantičke promjene i dinamike frekvencije u slang', 'ca': 'Slangvolution: {A} Anàlisi Causal of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'cs': '{A} Příčinná analýza sémantické změny a frekvenční dynamiky ve Slangu', 'et': 'Slangvolution: {A} Slangi semantilise muutuse ja sagedusdünaamika põhjuslik analüüs', 'fi': 'Slangvolution: {A} Slangin semanttisen muutoksen ja taajuuden dynamiikan syy-analyysi', 'jv': 'Slangvolution:  {A}Cause Test of semanti c Change and Refresh dynamics in Slang', 'sk': '{A} Vzrokovna analiza semantičnih sprememb in frekvenčne dinamike v žlindri', 'he': 'Slangvolution: {A} Analysis Causal of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'bo': 'Slangvolution: {A} Causal Analysis of Semantic Change and Frequency Dynamics in Slang'}
{'en': 'Code completion, which aims to predict the following code token(s) according to the code context, can improve the productivity of software development. Recent work has proved that statistical language modeling with transformers can greatly improve the performance in the code completion task via learning from large-scale source code datasets. However, current approaches focus only on code context within the file or project, i.e. internal context. Our distinction is utilizing ”external” context, inspired by human behaviors of copying from the related code snippets when writing code. Specifically, we propose a retrieval-augmented code completion framework, leveraging both lexical copying and referring to code with similar semantics by retrieval. We adopt a stage-wise training approach that combines a source code retriever and an auto-regressive language model for programming language. We evaluate our approach in the code completion task in Python and Java programming languages, achieving a state-of-the-art performance on CodeXGLUE benchmark.', 'ar': 'تخضع اللغات لتغييرات مستمرة ، والآليات التي تكمن وراء هذه التغييرات لا تزال موضع نقاش. في هذا العمل ، نتعامل مع تطور اللغة من خلال عدسة السببية من أجل صياغة نموذج ليس فقط لكيفية ارتباط عوامل التوزيع المختلفة بتغير اللغة ، ولكن أيضًا كيفية تأثيرها سببيًا. على وجه الخصوص ، ندرس اللغة العامية ، وهي لغة غير رسمية تقتصر عادةً على مجموعة معينة أو بيئة اجتماعية. نقوم بتحليل التغيير الدلالي وتغيير التردد للكلمات العامية ومقارنتها بتلك الكلمات القياسية غير اللغوية. من خلال تقنيات الاكتشاف السببي والاستدلال السببي ، نقيس تأثير نوع الكلمة (العامية / nonslang) على كل من التغيير الدلالي وتحول التردد ، بالإضافة إلى علاقتها بالتردد وتعدد المعاني وجزء من الكلام. يوفر تحليلنا بعض الأفكار الجديدة في دراسة تغيير اللغة ، على سبيل المثال ، نظهر أن الكلمات العامية تخضع لتغيير دلالي أقل ولكنها تميل إلى حدوث تغييرات أكبر في التردد بمرور الوقت.', 'es': 'Los idiomas están sufriendo cambios continuos, y los mecanismos que subyacen a estos cambios siguen siendo objeto de debate. En este trabajo, abordamos la evolución del lenguaje a través de la lente de la causalidad para modelar no solo cómo varios factores de distribución se asocian con el cambio del lenguaje, sino cómo lo afectan causalmente. En particular, estudiamos la jerga, que es un lenguaje informal que normalmente se restringe a un grupo o entorno social específico. Analizamos el cambio semántico y el cambio de frecuencia de las palabras del argot y los comparamos con los de las palabras estándar que no son del argot. Con técnicas de descubrimiento causal e inferencia causal, medimos el efecto que el tipo de palabra (jerga o no jerga) tiene tanto en el cambio semántico como en el cambio de frecuencia, así como su relación con la frecuencia, la polisemia y la parte del habla. Nuestro análisis proporciona algunas ideas nuevas en el estudio del cambio de lenguaje, por ejemplo, mostramos que las palabras del argot sufren menos cambios semánticos, pero tienden a tener cambios de frecuencia más grandes con el tiempo.', 'pt': 'As línguas estão em constante mudança e os mecanismos subjacentes a essas mudanças ainda são motivo de debate. Neste trabalho, abordamos a evolução da linguagem através da lente da causalidade para modelar não apenas como vários fatores distributivos se associam à mudança da linguagem, mas como eles a afetam causalmente. Em particular, estudamos a gíria, que é uma linguagem informal normalmente restrita a um grupo ou ambiente social específico. Analisamos a mudança semântica e a mudança de frequência das gírias e as comparamos com as palavras padrão, sem gírias. Com técnicas de descoberta causal e inferência causal, medimos o efeito que o tipo de palavra (gíria/não gíria) tem tanto na mudança semântica quanto na mudança de frequência, bem como sua relação com a frequência, polissemia e parte do discurso. Nossa análise fornece alguns novos insights no estudo da mudança de linguagem, por exemplo, mostramos que as gírias sofrem menos mudanças semânticas, mas tendem a ter maiores mudanças de frequência ao longo do tempo.', 'fr': "Les langues sont en constante évolution, et les mécanismes qui sous-tendent ces changements font toujours l'objet de débats. Dans ce travail, nous abordons l'évolution du langage sous l'angle de la causalité afin de modéliser non seulement la façon dont divers facteurs de distribution s'associent au changement de langue, mais aussi la façon dont ils l'affectent de manière causale. En particulier, nous étudions l'argot, qui est une langue informelle qui est généralement limitée à un groupe ou à un environnement social spécifique. Nous analysons le changement sémantique et le décalage de fréquence des mots d'argot et les comparons à ceux des mots classiques non argotiques. À l'aide de techniques de découverte causale et d'inférence causale, nous mesurons l'effet du type de mot (argo/nonargot) à la fois sur le changement sémantique et le décalage de fréquence, ainsi que sa relation avec la fréquence, la polysémie et la partie du discours. Notre analyse fournit de nouvelles informations dans l'étude du changement de langue, par exemple, nous montrons que les mots d'argot subissent moins de changements sémantiques mais ont tendance à avoir des changements de fréquence plus importants au fil du temps.", 'zh': '语言在变化,变化犹争议。 以此观之,因果关系视角以论言进化,非徒拟列因变而拟因果影响也。 吾辈学俚语,非正言也,常限特定群境。 论俚语语义变频移,比之非俚语单词。 因果推理,量单词(俚语/非俚语)语义变频移,与频率、多义词性。 吾论新言变者,俚语单词语义小,随时转移,往往有大变。', 'ja': '言語は継続的に変化しており、これらの変化の根底にあるメカニズムはまだ議論の対象となっています。この研究では、さまざまな分布要因が言語の変化にどのように関連しているかだけでなく、それがどのように因果関係を持って影響しているかをモデル化するために、因果関係のレンズを通して言語進化にアプローチします。特に、特定のグループや社会的環境に限定された非公式言語であるスラングを研究しています。私たちは、スラング単語の意味変化と頻度シフトを分析し、標準的な非スラング単語と比較します。因果関係の発見と因果推論の手法を用いて、私たちは、単語タイプ（スラング/非スラング）が意味変化と頻度シフトの両方に及ぼす影響、および頻度、多義性、発話の一部との関係を測定します。私たちの分析は、言語変化の研究におけるいくつかの新しい洞察を提供します。たとえば、スラング単語は意味変化が少ないが、時間の経過とともにより大きな頻度シフトを有する傾向があることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Языки постоянно претерпевают изменения, и механизмы, лежащие в основе этих изменений, по-прежнему являются предметом обсуждения. В этой работе мы подходим к эволюции языка через призму причинно-следственной связи, чтобы смоделировать не только то, как различные факторы распределения ассоциируются с изменением языка, но и то, как они причинно влияют на него. В частности, мы изучаем сленг, который является неформальным языком, который обычно ограничивается конкретной группой или социальной средой. Мы анализируем семантическое изменение и сдвиг частоты сленговых слов и сравниваем их со стандартными, несланговыми словами. С помощью методов каузального обнаружения и каузального вывода мы измеряем влияние, которое тип слова (сленг/несланг) оказывает как на семантическое изменение, так и на сдвиг частоты, а также его связь с частотой, полисемией и частью речи. Наш анализ дает некоторые новые идеи в изучении изменения языка, например, мы показываем, что сленговые слова претерпевают меньше семантических изменений, но, как правило, имеют большие сдвиги частоты с течением времени.', 'hi': 'भाषाएं लगातार परिवर्तनों से गुजर रही हैं, और इन परिवर्तनों को रेखांकित करने वाले तंत्र अभी भी बहस का विषय हैं। इस काम में, हम कार्य-कारण के लेंस के माध्यम से भाषा के विकास से संपर्क करते हैं ताकि न केवल मॉडल किया जा सके कि विभिन्न वितरण कारक भाषा परिवर्तन के साथ कैसे जुड़ते हैं, बल्कि वे इसे कैसे प्रभावित करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम स्लैंग का अध्ययन करते हैं, जो एक अनौपचारिक भाषा है जो आमतौर पर एक विशिष्ट समूह या सामाजिक सेटिंग तक सीमित होती है। हम स्लैंग शब्दों के शब्दार्थ परिवर्तन और आवृत्ति बदलाव का विश्लेषण करते हैं और उनकी तुलना मानक, गैर-कठबोली शब्दों से करते हैं। कारण खोज और कारण अनुमान तकनीकों के साथ, हम उस प्रभाव को मापते हैं जो शब्द प्रकार (स्लैंग / नॉनस्लैंग) दोनों शब्दार्थ परिवर्तन और आवृत्ति बदलाव पर होता है, साथ ही साथ आवृत्ति, पॉलीसेमी और भाषण के हिस्से के साथ इसका संबंध होता है। हमारा विश्लेषण भाषा परिवर्तन के अध्ययन में कुछ नई अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करता है, उदाहरण के लिए, हम दिखाते हैं कि कठबोली शब्द कम शब्दार्थ परिवर्तन से गुजरते हैं लेकिन समय के साथ बड़ी आवृत्ति बदलाव होते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá teangacha ag dul faoi athruithe go leanúnach, agus is ábhar díospóireachta fós iad na meicníochtaí atá mar bhonn leis na hathruithe sin. Sa saothar seo, tugaimid faoi éabhlóid teanga trí lionsa na cúisíochta chun samhail a dhéanamh ní amháin ar an gcaoi a bhfuil baint ag fachtóirí dáileadh éagsúla le hathrú teanga, ach ar an gcaoi a mbíonn tionchar cúiseach acu air. Déanaimid staidéar go háirithe ar slang, ar teanga neamhfhoirmiúil í atá teoranta go hiondúil do ghrúpa nó suíomh sóisialta ar leith. Déanaimid anailís ar athrú shéimeantach agus ar aistriú minicíochta na bhfocal slang agus déanaimid iad a chur i gcomparáid leis na cinn a bhaineann le focail chaighdeánacha neamhshlang. Le teicníochtaí fionnachtana cúise agus tátail chúise, tomhaisimid an éifeacht a bhíonn ag cineál focal (slang/nonslang) ar athrú shéimeantach agus ar aistriú minicíochta, chomh maith lena ghaolmhaireacht le minicíocht, polaiséim agus cuid cainte. Soláthraíonn ár n-anailís roinnt léargais nua sa staidéar ar athrú teanga, m.sh., léirímid go n-athraítear níos lú séimeantaigh ar fhocail slang ach go mbíonn de ghnáth aistrithe minicíochta níos mó acu le himeacht ama.', 'el': 'Οι γλώσσες υφίστανται συνεχώς αλλαγές και οι μηχανισμοί που διέπουν αυτές τις αλλαγές εξακολουθούν να αποτελούν θέμα συζήτησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προσεγγίζουμε την εξέλιξη της γλώσσας μέσα από το φακό της αιτιώδους συνάφειας, προκειμένου να μοντελοποιήσουμε όχι μόνο το πώς διάφοροι παράγοντες κατανομής συσχετίζονται με την αλλαγή της γλώσσας, αλλά και πώς την επηρεάζουν αιτιολογικά. Ειδικότερα, μελετούμε την αργκό, η οποία είναι μια άτυπη γλώσσα που συνήθως περιορίζεται σε μια συγκεκριμένη ομάδα ή κοινωνικό περιβάλλον. Αναλύουμε τη σημασιολογική αλλαγή και τη μετατόπιση συχνότητας των λέξεων αργκό και τις συγκρίνουμε με αυτές των τυπικών, μη αργών λέξεων. Με τις τεχνικές αιτιώδους ανακάλυψης και αιτιώδους συμπερασμάτων, μετράμε την επίδραση που έχει ο τύπος λέξης (αργκό/μη) τόσο στη σημασιολογική αλλαγή όσο και στη μετατόπιση συχνότητας, καθώς και τη σχέση του με τη συχνότητα, την πολυσημία και το μέρος της ομιλίας. Η ανάλυσή μας παρέχει μερικές νέες ιδέες στη μελέτη της γλωσσικής αλλαγής, π.χ., δείχνουμε ότι οι λέξεις αργκό υφίστανται λιγότερες σημασιολογικές αλλαγές αλλά τείνουν να έχουν μεγαλύτερες μεταβολές συχνότητας με την πάροδο του χρόνου.', 'hu': 'A nyelvek folyamatosan változnak, és a változások mögött álló mechanizmusok még mindig vita tárgyát képezik. Ebben a munkában az okozati összefüggés lencséjén keresztül közelítjük meg a nyelv evolúcióját annak érdekében, hogy nemcsak modellezzük, hogy a különböző disztribúciós tényezők hogyan kapcsolódnak a nyelv változásához, hanem hogy ezek hogyan befolyásolják azt okozati összefüggésben. Különösen a szlenget tanulmányozzuk, ami egy informális nyelv, amely jellemzően egy adott csoportra vagy társadalmi környezetre korlátozódik. Elemezzük a szleng szavak szemantikai változását és frekvenciaeltolódását, és összehasonlítjuk őket a standard, nem nyelvű szavakkal. Az okozati felfedezési és okozati következtetési technikákkal mérjük a szótípus (szleng/nonlang) hatását mind a szemantikai változásra, mind a frekvenciaváltozásra, mind pedig a frekvenciaváltozásra, a poliszémiára és a beszéd részére. Elemzésünk néhány új betekintést nyújt a nyelvváltozás tanulmányozásába, például azt mutatjuk, hogy a szleng szavak kevésbé szemantikai változáson mennek keresztül, de idővel nagyobb frekvenciaváltozásokat mutatnak.', 'ka': 'ენები მუშაობელად ცვლილებები გავაკეთებენ, და ეს ცვლილებების საშუალებაში მუშაობელი მექანემი არსებობს დიბატის შესახებ. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ენის ეგოლუციაზე მივიღეთ, რადგან მივიღეთ რადგან განსხვავებული განსხვავებული ფაქტორები ენის ცვლილების შესახებ, მაგრამ როგორ ისინი მივიღეთ ამას. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ კონფიგურაციას ვისწავლობთ, რომელიც ინფორმალური ენაა, რომელიც განსაკუთრებული ჯგუფი ან სოციალური განსაკუთრებისთვის დავუ ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ სემონტიკური ცვლილება და სიტყვების სიტყვების გადაცვლილება და ისინი სტანდარტური, გადაცვლილებელი სიტყვების გადასრულება. მიზეზი განახლება და მიზეზი ინფრენციის ტექნოგიებით, ჩვენ მიზეზით ეფექტი, რომელიც სიტყვების ტიპი (slang/nonslang) აქვს ორივე სმენტიკური ცვლილება და ფერიკური ცვლილების შეცვლაზე, და მისი შესახებ ფ ჩვენი ანალიზია ახალი შესახებ ენის ცვლილების კვლევაში, მაგალითად ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სიტყვები ცვლილებაში უფრო მეტანტიური ცვლილება, მაგრამ უფრო მეტი სიტყვები გადატ', 'it': "Le lingue subiscono continui cambiamenti e i meccanismi che sottendono questi cambiamenti sono ancora oggetto di discussione. In questo lavoro, affrontiamo l'evoluzione del linguaggio attraverso la lente della causalità al fine di modellare non solo come vari fattori distributivi si associano al cambiamento del linguaggio, ma come essi influenzano causalmente esso. In particolare, studiamo lo slang, che è un linguaggio informale che è tipicamente limitato a un determinato gruppo o ambiente sociale. Analizziamo il cambiamento semantico e lo spostamento di frequenza delle parole slang e le confrontiamo con quelle delle parole standard, non lang. Con le tecniche di scoperta causale e inferenza causale, misuriamo l'effetto che il tipo di parola (slang/nonlang) ha sia sul cambiamento semantico che sul cambiamento di frequenza, così come la sua relazione con frequenza, polisemia e parte del discorso. La nostra analisi fornisce alcune nuove intuizioni nello studio del cambiamento linguistico, ad esempio, mostriamo che le parole slang subiscono meno cambiamenti semantici ma tendono ad avere cambiamenti di frequenza più grandi nel tempo.", 'lt': 'Kalbos nuolat keičiamos, o mechanizmai, kuriais grindžiami šie pokyčiai, vis dar svarstomi. In this work, we approach language evolution through the lens of causality in order to model not only how various distributional factors associate with language change, but how they causally affect it.  Visų pirma mes mokome slang ą, kuri yra neoficiali kalba, kuri paprastai apsiriboja konkrečia grupe ar socialine aplinka. Analizuojame semantinius slango žodžių pokyčius ir dažnį ir palyginame juos su standartiniais, ne slango žodžiais. Pagal priežastinio atradimo ir priežastinio padarinio metodus matuojame žodžio tipo (slang/nonslang) poveikį tiek semantiniam pokyčiui, tiek dažnio pokyčiui, taip pat jo ryšiui su dažniu, polisemija ir kalbos dalimi. Mūsų analizė suteikia tam tikrą naują supratimą kalbos pokyčių tyrime, pvz., rodome, kad slang žodžiai keičiasi mažiau semantiškai, bet dažniau keičiasi laikui bėgant.', 'mk': 'Јазиците постојано претрпеваат промени, а механизмите кои ги поткрепуваат овие промени сé уште се прашање на дебата. Во оваа работа, се приближуваме до еволуцијата на јазикот преку очилата на причината со цел да моделираме не само како различните дистрибутивни фактори се поврзуваат со промената на јазикот, туку и како тие причински влијаат на него. Особено, ние студираме сланг, кој е неформален јазик кој е обично ограничен на специфична група или социјална средина. Ние ја анализираме семантичката промена и фреквентната промена на сланг зборовите и ги споредуваме со оние на стандардни, не сланг зборови. Со причинско откритие и причинска техника на инференција, го мериме ефектот на зборот тип (slang/nonslang) на семантичната промена и промената на фреквенцијата, како и нејзината врска со фреквенцијата, полисимијата и делот од говорот. Our analysis provides some new insights in the study of language change, e.g., we show that slang words undergo less semantic change but tend to have larger frequency shifts over time.', 'ms': 'Bahasa terus-menerus mengalami perubahan, dan mekanisme yang mendasarkan perubahan ini masih masalah debat. Dalam kerja ini, kita mendekati evolusi bahasa melalui lensa penyebabnya untuk memmodelkan bukan sahaja bagaimana pelbagai faktor distribusi berkaitan dengan perubahan bahasa, tetapi bagaimana mereka menyebabkannya mempengaruhinya. Secara khususnya, kami belajar slang, bahasa yang tidak formal yang biasanya diharamkan kepada kumpulan tertentu atau seting sosial. Kami menganalisis perubahan semantik dan perubahan frekuensi perkataan slang dan membandingkannya dengan perkataan standar, bukan slang. Dengan penemuan penyebab dan teknik kesimpulan penyebab, kita mengukur kesan jenis perkataan (slang/nonslang) pada perubahan semantik dan perubahan frekuensi, serta hubungannya dengan frekuensi, polisemi dan sebahagian dari ucapan. Analisis kami memberikan beberapa pandangan baru dalam kajian perubahan bahasa, misalnya, kami menunjukkan bahawa kata-kata slang mengalami perubahan yang kurang semantik tetapi cenderung untuk mempunyai perubahan frekuensi yang lebih besar pada masa.', 'kk': 'Тілдер өзгерістерді жалғастырып жатқан, және бұл өзгерістердің негізгі механизмтері әлі дебаттау маңызды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз тілді эволюциялық линзиялық линзиялық арқылы тілді өзгерту үшін не тек тілді өзгерту үшін әртүрлі тарату факторларының қаншалығын түсіндіру үшін, бі Әрине біз сұлбаны зерттейміз, бұл кәдімгі топ не әлемдік параметрлерге шектелген ақпаратты тіл. Семантикалық өзгерістерді және жылдамдықты сөздердің жылдамдығын анализ және оларды стандартты сөздермен салыстырып келеді. Семантикалық өзгерістер мен жиіліктерді өзгерту және оның жиіліктері, полизиясы және сөздердің бөлігіне қатынасыз бар. Анализациямыз тіл өзгерістерін зерттеу үшін жаңа түсініктерді көрсетеді, мысалы, сөздерді өзгерту кезінде аз деп көрсетеді, бірақ уақыт бойынша үлкен жиіліктерді өзгерту керек.', 'ml': 'Languages are continuously undergoing changes, and the mechanisms that underlie these changes are still a matter of debate.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, ഭാഷയുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ഥാനത്തിലൂടെ നമ്മുടെ അടുത്ത് വരുന്നു. ഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങളുമായി വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല, പക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്ലാങ്ങ് പഠിക്കുന്നു, അതൊരു അനുയായമായ ഭാഷ, സാധാരണ ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ഗ്രൂപ്പോ സാമൂഹിക സജ സ്ലാങ്ക് വാക്കുകളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് മാറ്റങ്ങളും ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് മാറ്റുന്നതും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള കാരണം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനും കാരണങ്ങളില്\u200d അപകടത്തിനും കൊണ്ട്, വാക്കിന്റെ തരത്തില്\u200d (സ്ലാങ്ങ്/അസ്ലാങ്ങ്) സെമാന്റിക് മാറ്റുന്നതിനും ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് മാ നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം ഭാഷ മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ പഠനത്തില്\u200d കുറച്ച് പുതിയ കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി സ്ലാങ്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d കുറച്ച് സെമാന', 'no': 'Språk er fortsatt undergåande endringar, og mekanismene som undergår desse endringane er fortsatt eit debatt. I denne arbeida nærmer vi språk-evolusjonen gjennom lensen av årsakelse for å modellere ikkje bare korleis ulike distribusjonsfaktorar tilknyttar språk-endringar, men korleis dei følgjer å påvirke det. I særskilt studerer vi slang, som er eit informalt språk som vanlegvis er begrenset til ein spesifikke gruppe eller sosialt innstilling. Vi analyserer semantiske endringar og frekvensskift av slang ord og samanliknar dei med standardverdiane, ikkje slang ord. Med grunnleggjande oppdaging og grunnleggjande infeksjonssteknikk målar vi effekten som ordtypen (slang/nonslang) har på både semantiske endringar og frekvensskift, og forholdet til frekvens, polysemi og del av tale. Analysen vårt gjev nokre nye innsikt i studien av språk-endringar, f.eks. vi viser at slang av ord gjer mindre semantiske endringar, men vanlegvis har større frekvensskifter over tid.', 'pl': 'Języki nieustannie ulegają zmianie, a mechanizmy, które leżą u podstaw tych zmian, nadal są kwestią debaty. W niniejszej pracy podchodzimy do ewolucji języka za pośrednictwem soczewki przyczynowości w celu modelowania nie tylko tego, jak różne czynniki dystrybucyjne wiążą się ze zmianą językową, ale także jak na nią wpływają przyczynowo. W szczególności badamy slang, który jest językiem nieformalnym, który zazwyczaj ogranicza się do określonej grupy lub otoczenia społecznego. Analizujemy zmianę semantyczną i zmianę częstotliwości slangowych słów i porównujemy je do standardowych, niedługich słów. Za pomocą technik odkrywania przyczynowego i wnioskowania przyczynowego mierzymy wpływ, jaki typ słowa (slang/nieszlang) ma zarówno na zmianę semantyczną, jak i zmianę częstotliwości, a także jego związek z częstotliwością, polisemią i częścią mowy. Nasza analiza dostarcza kilku nowych spostrzeżeń w badaniu zmian językowych, np. pokazujemy, że słowa slangowe ulegają mniejszej zmianie semantycznej, ale mają tendencję do większych zmian częstotliwości w czasie.', 'mt': 'Il-lingwi għaddejjin minn bidliet kontinwi, u l-mekkaniżmi li fuqhom huma bbażati dawn il-bidliet għadhom kwistjoni ta’ dibattitu. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna nindirizzaw l-evoluzzjoni tal-lingwa permezz tal-lenti tal-kawżalità sabiex nimmudellaw mhux biss kif diversi fatturi ta’ distribuzzjoni jassoċjaw mal-bidla fil-lingwa, iżda kif dawn jaffettwawha b’mod kawżali. B’mod partikolari, nistudjaw is-slang, li huwa lingwa informali li tipikament hija ristretta għal grupp speċifiku jew ambjent soċjali. Aħna nianalizzaw il-bidla semantika u l-bidla fil-frekwenza tal-kliem slang u nqabbluhom ma’ dawk tal-kliem standard, mhux slang. Bl-iskoperta kawżali u t-tekniki ta’ inferenza kawżali, aħna nqisu l-effett li t-tip ta’ kelma (slang/nonslang) għandu kemm fuq il-bidla semantika kif ukoll fuq il-bidla fil-frekwenza, kif ukoll ir-relazzjoni tiegħu mal-frekwenza, il-polisimja u parti mid-diskors. L-analiżi tagħna tipprovdi xi fehmiet ġodda fl-istudju tal-bidla fil-lingwa, pereżempju, nuru li l-kliem slang jgħaddi minn bidla inqas semantika iżda g ħandhom tendenza li jkollhom bidliet akbar fil-frekwenza maż-żmien.', 'mn': 'Хэлүүд үргэлж өөрчлөлт хийж байгаа бөгөөд эдгээр өөрчлөлтийн доор байгаа механизм нь хэлэлцээний асуудал юм. Энэ ажил дээр бид хэл хөгжлийн хувьсалыг үр дүнгийн линзийг ашиглаж, хэл өөрчлөлтийг хэрхэн холбоотой вэ гэдгийг загварчлахын тулд зөвхөн хэл өөрчлөлтийг загварчлах боломжтой. Ялангуяа, бид сланг судлаж байна. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн тодорхой бүлэг эсвэл нийгмийн байрлалд хязгаарлагддаг. Бид семантик өөрчлөлтийг, давхар хэмжээний өөрчлөлтийг шинжилж, стандарт, буруу үгсийг харьцуулж байна. Яагаад гэвэл олох болон үр дүнтэй халдварын техникуудын тулд бид үгний төрлийн нөлөөг (сланг/nonslang) хоёулаа семантик өөрчлөлт, давхар шилжүүлэхэд, түүний давхар, полизим болон ярианы хэсгийг хэмжиж байна. Бидний шинжилгээнд хэл өөрчлөлтийн судалгаанд зарим шинэ ойлголт гаргадаг. Жишээлбэл, бид үгнүүдийг семантийн өөрчлөлт бага байдаг гэхдээ цаг хугацаанд их хэмжээний өөрчлөлт гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Limbile sunt în continuă schimbări, iar mecanismele care stau la baza acestor schimbări sunt încă o chestiune de dezbatere. În această lucrare, abordăm evoluția limbajului prin lentila cauzalității pentru a modela nu numai modul în care diferiți factori distribuționali se asociază cu schimbarea limbajului, ci și modul în care aceștia o afectează cauzal. În special, studiem slang-ul, care este un limbaj informal care este de obicei limitat la un anumit grup sau cadru social. Analizăm schimbarea semantică și schimbarea frecvenței cuvintelor slang și le comparăm cu cele ale cuvintelor standard, non-lang. Cu ajutorul tehnicilor de descoperire cauzală și inferență cauzală, măsurăm efectul pe care tipul de cuvânt (slang/nonlang) îl are atât asupra schimbării semantice, cât și asupra schimbării frecvenței, precum și relația acestuia cu frecvența, polisemia și o parte a vorbirii. Analiza noastră oferă câteva perspective noi în studiul schimbării limbajului, de exemplu, arătăm că cuvintele slang suferă mai puțin schimbări semantice, dar tind să aibă schimbări mai mari de frecvență în timp.', 'sr': 'Jezici se stalno bave promenama, a mehanizami koji su pod ovim promenama još uvijek predstavljaju debatu. U ovom poslu, približavamo evoluciji jezika kroz lense uzrokovanih uzrokovanih različitih faktora koji se povezuju sa promjenom jezika, već na način na koji su ga uzrokovali. Posebno, proučavamo slang, koji je neformalni jezik koji je obično ograničen na određenu grupu ili društvenu postavku. Analiziramo semantièku promenu i promenu frekvencije slanja reèi i uspoređujemo ih sa standardnim, bezslang reèima. Uz uzrokovane tehnike otkrivanja i uzrokovane infekcije, mjerimo učinak koji tip reči (slang/nonslang) ima na semantičku promenu i promenu frekvencije, kao i njegovu vezu sa frekvencijom, polizmom i deom govora. Naša analiza pruža neke nove uvide u studiji promjene jezika, na primer, pokazujemo da slanje reèi proizvode manje semantične promjene, ali tendira da imaju veæe promjene frekvencije tokom vremena.', 'so': 'Luqaduhu waxay sii socotaa is-beddelyo, meymisyada ku hoos dhiga beddeladana weli waa arrin debaar ah. Shaqadan, waxaynu ku soo dhowaynaa bedelka luqada, si aan u sameynno sida sababta kala duduwan ay u leeyihiin beddelka luuqada, laakiin sida ay sababta ugu saameyso. Si gaar ah, waxaynu baranaynaa barashada bannaanka, taas oo ah luqad a an rasmi lahayn oo sida caadiga ah u xadgudbay koox gaar ah ama qorshaha bulshada. Waxaannu baaraynaa beddelka isbedelka iyo isbedelka hadalka saqafka ah, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa hadallada caadiga ah oo aan la hadlin. Dhakhtarka baaritaanka iyo cilmiga sababta ah, waxaynu qiyaasaynaa saamaynta ku saabsan qoraalka (snadda/nonslang) uu ku leeyahay isbedelka iyo isbedelka jidhka iyo isbedelka, sidoo kale xiriirka ku saabsan frequencada, polysemiga iyo qaybta hadalka. Analyskayagu wuxuu ka helaa qalabka cusub e e waxbarashada beddelka luqada, tusaale ahaan waxaynu tusnaa in hadalka qalloociya wax ka yar isbedelka midabka, laakiin waxaa inta badan la beddelaa isbedelka badan.', 'sv': 'Språken genomgår ständigt förändringar och de mekanismer som ligger till grund för dessa förändringar diskuteras fortfarande. I detta arbete närmar vi oss språkutveckling genom kausalitetens lins för att modellera inte bara hur olika distributionsfaktorer associeras med språkförändring, utan hur de orsakssamband påverkar den. I synnerhet studerar vi slang, som är ett informellt språk som vanligtvis är begränsat till en specifik grupp eller social miljö. Vi analyserar den semantiska förändringen och frekvensförskjutningen av slangord och jämför dem med standardord. Med kausal discovery och kausal inference tekniker mäter vi effekten som ordtyp (slang/nonlang) har på både semantisk förändring och frekvensförskjutning, samt dess relation till frekvens, polysemi och delar av tal. Vår analys ger några nya insikter i studiet av språkförändringar, t.ex. visar vi att slangord genomgår mindre semantisk förändring men tenderar att ha större frekvensförskjutningar över tid.', 'ta': 'மொழிகள் தொடர்ந்து மாற்றங்களை நடத்துகின்றன, மற்றும் இந்த மாற்றங்களை கொண்டுள்ள மாற்றங்கள் இன்னும் விவாதத் In this work, we approach language evolution through the lens of causality in order to model not only how various distributional factors associate with language change, but how they causally affect it.  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் சங்கை கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம், அது ஒரு வழக்கமாக ஒரு குழு அல்லது சமூக அமைப்பு நாம் பாதிப்பு மாற்றம் மற்றும் வார்த்தைகளின் அதிர்வெண்ட் மாற்றம் மற்றும் பேச்சு மாற்றத்தை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மற் காரணத்தின் கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் காரணத்தின் காரணத்தால், வார்த்தை வகை( சாம்பல்/பேச்சு இல்லாமல்) இருவரும் பெரும்பான மாற்றம் மற்றும் அதிர்வெண்ட், போலி எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி மொழி மாற்றத்தின் படிப்பில் சில புதிய குறிப்புகளை வழங்குகிறது, உதாரணமாக, சில வார்த்தைகள் குறைந்து அரைத்து மாற்றம', 'si': 'භාෂාවල් දිගටම වෙනස් වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ වෙනස් විදිහට පත්වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තාමත් විශ්වාස කරනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි භාෂාව විකෘතියෙන් පිළිගන්නවා කාරණාත්මකයේ ලෙන්ස් වලින්, භාෂාව වෙනස් එක්ක වෙනුවෙන් විවිධ විකෘ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ස්ලෑන්ග් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවක් විශේෂ කණ්ඩායමක් නැති සමාජික ස අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ස්ලෑන් වචන වෙනස් සහ සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික වෙනස් සහ සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික වචන වලට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සිමාන්තික වෙනස් සහ සිමාන්තික වෙනස් සහ සිමාන්තික වෙනස් සහ සිමාන්තික වෙනස් සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාව සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාව සමග ඒ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය සමහර අලුත් අදහස් දැනගන්නවා භාෂාව වෙනස් විදියට, උදාහරණයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වචන ස්ලෑන් විදියට පහර වෙනස්', 'ur': 'زبانیں ہمیشہ تغییرات کی حالت میں رہتے ہیں، اور ان تغییروں کے ذریعہ سے ان کی تغییرات ابھی بھی بحث کا مسئلہ ہے. اس کام میں ہم زبان تکامل کے ذریعہ منصفات کے لانس سے موڈل کرنے کے لئے پہنچ رہے ہیں، نہیں صرف ان کی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح مخصوصا، ہم اسلانگ کی تعلیم کرتے ہیں، جو ایک غیر معمولی زبان ہے جو معمولی طور پر ایک خاص گروپ یا سوسیلی تنظیم پر محدود ہے. ہم سمantic change اور frequency change of slang words and compare them to standard, nonslang words. باعث اثبات اور دلیل نازل کی تکنیک کے ساتھ، ہم نے کلمات کی تابع (slang/nonslang) کی تغییر اور فرکانسی تغییر پر نازل کی ہے، اور اس کی تعلق frequency, polysemy اور کلمات کی حصہ سے ہے. ہماری تحلیل میں زبان بدلنے کے تحقیق میں کچھ نو نظر پیش کرتا ہے، جیسے ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلمات بدلنے کے ذریعہ کم سیمنٹی بدلنے کے ذریعہ ہیں لیکن اس طرح بہت زیادہ فرکانس بدلنے کے ذریعہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Tillar davomida o'zgarishlarni harakat qiladi, va bu o'zgarishlar ichida o'zgarishlarning mechanislari hozir juda ham debar. Bu ishda, biz tillar evolyutsiyatlarini o'zgartirish uchun o'zgarishga o'xshab qolamiz, balki uni qanday sabablar sabablarga qo'llashadi mumkin. Ko'pchilikni o'rganamiz, bu oddiy foydalanuvchi bo'lgan guruhga yoki jamiyat moslamalariga murakkab bo'ladi. Biz so'zlarning semantik o'zgarishni va frekansa so'zlarning o'zgarishni nazar qilamiz va ularni andoza so'zlarning o'zlariga kamaytirish. Biz so'zlar o'zgartirish va sabablar qo'llanmalarni ko'rsatuvchimiz, so'zning turi (slang/nonslash) va freym o'zgarishlariga va suhbat o'zgarishga ega bo'lganligini o'ylaymiz, ko'paylik, polysemiya va gapirish bir qismiga bog'liq. Analysimizning tilning o'zgarishni o'rganishda bir necha ko'rinishimizni anglatadi. Masalan, chaqaloqlar so'zlarini semantik o'zgarishni ko'rsatamiz, lekin vaqtdan ko'proq frekvens o'zgarishlarini ko'paytirishni ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ đang liên tục thay đổi, và cơ chế nền tảng của những thay đổi này vẫn là một vấn đề tranh luận. Trong công trình này, chúng ta tiếp cận sự tiến hóa ngôn ngữ qua thấu kính nhân quả để mô tả không chỉ cách phân phối các yếu tố liên kết với sự thay đổi ngôn ngữ, mà còn cách chúng ảnh hưởng đến nó. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu nghệ thuật cổ, đó là một ngôn ngữ không chính thức thường được giới hạn cho một nhóm cụ thể hoặc một môi trường xã hội. Chúng ta phân tích sự thay đổi ngữ pháp và sự chuyển đổi tần số của từ nghiêng và so sánh chúng với từ thường, không liên tục. Với các kỹ thuật phát hiện hệ quả và nhận biết hệ quả, chúng tôi đo được tác động của loại từ (đường dài/không liên tục) lên cả sự thay đổi ngữ pháp và tần số, cũng như quan hệ với tần số, đa dạng và một phần của ngôn ngữ. Phân tích của chúng tôi cung cấp một số hiểu biết mới về nghiên cứu về sự thay đổi ngôn ngữ, ví dụ như, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng những từ ngữ tầm thường bị thay đổi ít ngữ pháp hơn, nhưng có xu hướng thay đổi tần số nhiều hơn.', 'bg': 'Езиците непрекъснато претърпяват промени и механизмите, които са в основата на тези промени, все още са въпрос на дебат. В тази работа ние подхождаме към езиковата еволюция през обектива на причинно-следствената връзка, за да моделираме не само как различните дистрибуционни фактори се свързват с езиковата промяна, но и как те причинно-следствено я влияят. По-специално изучаваме жаргона, който е неформален език, който обикновено е ограничен до определена група или социална обстановка. Анализираме семантичната промяна и честотата на смяната на жаргонските думи и ги сравняваме с тези на стандартните, неезикови думи. С техники за причинно-следствено откриване и причинно-следствен извод измерваме ефекта, който този тип дума (жаргон/несланг) има както върху семантичната промяна, така и върху честотната промяна, както и връзката му с честотата, полисемията и част от речта. Нашият анализ дава някои нови прозрения в изучаването на езиковата промяна, например показваме, че жаргонските думи претърпяват по-малко семантична промяна, но са склонни да имат по-големи честотни промени с течение на времето.', 'hr': 'Jezici se stalno mijenjaju, a mehanizami koji se temelji ovih promjena još uvijek predstavljaju raspravu. U ovom poslu, približavamo se razvoju jezika kroz lense uzrokovanih uzrokovanih različitih faktora koji se povezuju s promjenom jezika, već kako su ga uzrokovali. Posebno, proučavamo slang, koji je neformalni jezik koji je obično ograničen na određenu grupu ili društvenu postavku. Analiziramo semantičku promjenu i promjenu frekvencije slang riječi i uspoređujemo ih s standardnim, bezslang riječima. Uz uzrokovane tehnike otkrivanja i uzrokovane infekcije, mjerimo učinak koji tip riječi (slang/nonslang) ima na semantičku promjenu i promjenu učestalosti, kao i njegovu vezu sa frekvencijom, polizmom i dijelom govora. Naša analiza pruža neke nove uvide u ispitivanju promjene jezika, na primjer, pokazujemo da slanje riječi čin e manje semantičke promjene, ali tendira imati veće promjene učestalosti tijekom vremena.', 'da': 'Sprogene undergår konstant forandringer, og de mekanismer, der ligger til grund for disse forandringer, er stadig et spørgsmål om debat. I dette arbejde nærmer vi sprogudviklingen gennem kausalitetslinsen for at modellere ikke blot hvordan forskellige fordelingsfaktorer associeres med sprogændringer, men hvordan de kausalt påvirker det. Især studerer vi slang, som er et uformelt sprog, der typisk er begrænset til en bestemt gruppe eller sociale omgivelser. Vi analyserer den semantiske ændring og frekvensforskydning af slangord og sammenligner dem med dem af standard, ikke lange ord. Med kausal discovery og kausal inference teknikker måler vi den effekt, som ordtype (slang/nonlang) har på både semantisk ændring og frekvensskift, samt dets forhold til frekvens, polysemi og en del af tale. Vores analyse giver nogle nye indsigter i studiet af sprogforandringer, f.eks. viser vi, at slangord gennemgår mindre semantisk forandring, men har tendens til at have større frekvensskift over tid.', 'nl': 'Talen ondergaan voortdurend veranderingen en de mechanismen die ten grondslag liggen aan deze veranderingen zijn nog steeds onderwerp van discussie. In dit werk benaderen we taalevolutie vanuit de lens van causaliteit om niet alleen te modelleren hoe verschillende distributiefactoren associëren met taalverandering, maar hoe ze deze causaal beïnvloeden. In het bijzonder bestuderen we slang, een informele taal die meestal beperkt is tot een specifieke groep of sociale omgeving. We analyseren de semantische verandering en frequentieverschuiving van slangwoorden en vergelijken deze met die van standaard, niet-lange woorden. Met causale ontdekking en causale inferentie technieken meten we het effect dat woordtype (slang/nonlang) heeft op zowel semantische verandering als frequentieverschuiving, evenals de relatie met frequentie, polysemie en deel van spraak. Onze analyse geeft enkele nieuwe inzichten in de studie van taalverandering, bijvoorbeeld laten we zien dat slangwoorden minder semantische veranderingen ondergaan, maar in de loop van de tijd grotere frequentieverschuivingen vertonen.', 'ko': '언어가 끊임없이 변화하고 있는데, 이러한 변화 배후의 메커니즘은 여전히 논쟁의 문제이다.이 작업에서 우리는 인과관계의 시각을 통해 언어의 진화를 연구한다. 각종 분배 요소가 언어 변화와 어떻게 관련이 있는지 모의하기 위해서일 뿐만 아니라 그들이 어떻게 인과가 언어 변화에 영향을 미치는지도 모의하기 위해서이다.우리는 특히 비속어를 연구하는데, 이것은 비공식적인 언어로 통상적으로 특정 단체나 사회 환경에만 한정된다.우리는 비속어의 의미 변화와 빈도 이동을 분석하고 이를 표준, 비속어와 비교했다.인과 발견과 인과 추리 기술을 통해 우리는 단어 유형(비속어/비속어)이 의미 변화와 주파수 편이에 미치는 영향, 그리고 그것과 주파수, 다의와 어성의 관계를 측정했다.우리의 분석은 언어 변화에 대한 연구에 새로운 견해를 제공했다. 예를 들어 우리는 비속어가 겪은 의미 변화가 비교적 적지만 시간의 추이에 따라 빈도 변화가 왕왕 더 크다는 것을 발견했다.', 'id': 'Bahasa terus menerus mengalami perubahan, dan mekanisme yang mendasarkan perubahan-perubahan ini masih masalah debat. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita mendekati evolusi bahasa melalui lensa penyebabnya untuk memmodelir tidak hanya bagaimana berbagai faktor distribusi berhubungan dengan perubahan bahasa, tetapi bagaimana mereka menyebabkan mempengaruhinya. Terutama, kami mempelajari slang, yang merupakan bahasa informal yang biasanya terbatas kepada grup spesifik atau persediaan sosial. Kami menganalisis perubahan semantis dan perubahan frekuensi kata-kata slang dan membandingkannya dengan kata-kata standar, bukan slang. With causal discovery and causal inference techniques, we measure the effect that word type (slang/nonslang) has on both semantic change and frequency shift, as well as its relationship to frequency, polysemy and part of speech.  Analisi kami menyediakan beberapa pandangan baru dalam penelitian perubahan bahasa, misalnya, kami menunjukkan bahwa kata-kata slang mengalami perubahan yang kurang semantis tetapi cenderung untuk memiliki perubahan frekuensi yang lebih besar dengan waktu.', 'fa': 'زبانها همیشه تغییرات را تحت تاثیر قرار می گیرند، و مکانیسم های زیر این تغییرات هنوز مسئله بحث است. در این کار، ما با تغییرات زبان به طریق لینک دلایل نزدیک می شویم تا مدل کنیم نه تنها چگونه باعث تغییرات زبان است، بلکه چگونه باعث تاثیر آن است. مخصوصا، ما اسلانگ را مطالعه می کنیم، که یک زبان غیرمعمولی است که معمولاً به یک گروه خاص یا تنظیم اجتماعی محدود می شود. ما تغییرات سیمانتیک و فرکانس تغییرات کلمه\u200cها را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و آنها را با کلمه\u200cهای استاندارد، بی\u200cکلمه مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. با کشف باعث دلیل و تکنیک آلودگی باعث آلودگی، ما تاثیری را که نوع کلمه (slang/nonslang) بر تغییر سنتی و عوض فرکانسی دارد اندازه می\u200cگیریم، و رابطه\u200cاش با فرکانس، پلیسمی و بخشی سخنرانی دارد. تحلیل ما به تحلیل تغییرات زبان چند نظر جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد، مثال ما نشان می\u200cدهیم که کلمات تغییر سنتی کمتر می\u200cشود، ولی در طول زمان تغییر فرکانسی بزرگتر می\u200cشود.', 'de': 'Sprachen befinden sich in ständigem Wandel, und die Mechanismen, die diesen Veränderungen zugrunde liegen, sind nach wie vor Gegenstand der Debatte. In dieser Arbeit nähern wir uns der Sprachentwicklung durch die Linse der Kausalität, um nicht nur zu modellieren, wie verschiedene Verteilungsfaktoren mit Sprachveränderungen assoziiert werden, sondern wie sie diesen kausal beeinflussen. Insbesondere studieren wir Slang, eine informelle Sprache, die typischerweise auf eine bestimmte Gruppe oder soziale Umgebung beschränkt ist. Wir analysieren die semantische Veränderung und Frequenzverschiebung von Slangwörtern und vergleichen sie mit denen von Standard-, Non-Langwörtern. Mit kausalen Entdeckungs- und kausalen Inferenztechniken messen wir den Effekt, den Worttyp (Slang/Nonlang) sowohl auf semantische Veränderungen als auch auf Frequenzverschiebungen hat, sowie seine Beziehung zu Frequenz, Polysemie und Sprachteil. Unsere Analyse liefert einige neue Erkenntnisse in der Erforschung des Sprachwandels, z.B. zeigen wir, dass Slangwörter weniger semantische Veränderungen durchlaufen, aber tendenziell größere Frequenzverschiebungen im Laufe der Zeit aufweisen.', 'sw': 'Lugha zinaendelea kuendelea mabadiliko, na mfumo unaoendelea mabadiliko haya bado ni suala la mjadala. Katika kazi hii, tunakaribia mabadiliko ya lugha kupitia misingi ya sababu ili kuonyesha siyo tu jinsi sababu mbalimbali zinavyohusiana na mabadiliko ya lugha, lakini jinsi wanavyoathiri. Kwa hakika, tunasoma wimbo, ambao ni lugha isiyo rasmi ambayo kwa kawaida inazuiwa kwa kundi fulani au mazingira ya kijamii. Tunafanya uchambuzi wa mabadiliko ya kimapenzi na mabadiliko ya mara kwa mara ya maneno ya wizi na kuwalinganisha na maneno yasiyo ya kawaida. With causal discovery and causal inference techniques, we measure the effect that word type (slang/nonslang) has on both semantic change and frequency shift, as well as its relationship to frequency, polysemy and part of speech.  Uchambuzi wetu unatoa baadhi ya mitazamo mpya katika utafiti wa mabadiliko ya lugha, kwa mfano, tunaonyesha kwamba maneno ya unyanyasaji yanaendelea mabadiliko ya kimapenzi lakini huenda kuwa na mabadiliko makubwa zaidi ya mara kwa mara.', 'af': "Taal word voortdurende veranderinge onderwerp, en die mekanisme wat hierdie veranderinge onderwerp is nog 'n aangaan van debat. In hierdie werk het ons taal-evolusie aangekom deur die lense van oorsaaklikheid om te model nie net hoe verskillende verspreidingsfaktore met taal-verandering asosiaat, maar hoe hulle dit veroorsaak het. Spesifieke, ons studeer slang, wat is 'n onformele taal wat tipies beperk is a an 'n spesifieke groep of sosiale instelling. Ons analiseer die semantiese verandering en frekwensies verskuif van slang woorde en vergelyk hulle met die standaard, onslang woorde. Met oorsaaklike ontdekking en veroorsaaklike inferensie-teknike, maak ons die effek wat woord tipe (slang/nonslang) het op beide semantiese verandering en frekwensie-verskuif, asook sy verhouding met frekwensie, polisemie en deel van spreek. Ons analisie verskaf 'n paar nuwe insig in die studie van taal verander, bv. ons wys dat die slang van woorde minder semantiese verandering is, maar tendig om groter frekwensies veranderinge oor tyd te hê.", 'sq': 'Gjuhat po kalojnë vazhdimisht ndryshime dhe mekanizmat që mbështeten në këto ndryshime janë ende një çështje debati. Në këtë punë, ne afrohemi evolucionit të gjuhës nëpërmjet lentes së shkaktueshmërisë me qëllim që të modelojmë jo vetëm se si faktorë të ndryshëm shpërndarës lidhen me ndryshimin e gjuhës, por si ato shkaktuan ndikimin e saj. Në veçanti, ne studiojmë slang, i cili është një gjuhë jozyrtare që zakonisht është e kufizuar në një grup të caktuar apo në një qendër shoqërore. Ne analizojmë ndryshimin semantik dhe ndryshimin e frekuencave të fjalëve slang dhe i krahasojmë me ato të fjalëve standard, jo slang. Me zbulimin shkak dhe teknikat e përfundimit shkak, ne matëm efektin që tipi i fjalës (slang/nonslang) ka në ndryshimin semantik dhe ndryshimin e frekuencës, si dhe lidhjen e tij me frekuencën, polizimin dhe pjesën e fjalimit. Analiza jonë ofron disa kuptime të reja në studimin e ndryshimit të gjuhës, për shembull, ne tregojmë se fjalët slang kalojnë ndryshime më pak semantike por kanë tendencë të kenë ndryshime më të mëdha frekuence gjatë kohës.', 'tr': 'Diller hemişe üýtgeşmelerde bolýar, we bu üýtgeşmeleri garaýan mekanizmalar heniz hem debat meselesidir. Bu işde, biz dil evolusiýasyny göwnüligiň lensleri bilen nusgala etmek üçin dil üýtgewleri bilen nähili täsirleýän däldir, ýöne olaryň nähili täsirleýän netijesini görýäris. Aýratyn bolsa, biz slang dilini öwrenýärik, ol adatça bir topar ýa-da sosyal düzümlere diýjek resmi dildir. Semantik değişiklikleri ve sıklık sözlerin değişikliklerini analiz edip onları standart sözlerine karşılaştırıyoruz. Sebäbi açylyk we netijeli aşyk çykyş teknikleri bilen, söz hili (slang/nonslang) hem semantik üýtgewleri hem sıklyk üýtgewleri bolan ýaly sıklyk, polysemiýa we çykyş boluşynyň bir parçasynda täsirini ölýäris. Biziň analýusymyz dil üýtgeşiginiň arzuwynda täze pikirleri bar, mysal. sözleriň sözleriniň semantik üýtgeşiginiň azyndan däldigini g örkezýäris ýöne wagtyň daşynda örän çalt üýtgeşikleri bolýar.', 'hy': 'Languages are continuously undergoing changes, and the mechanisms that underlie these changes are still a matter of debate.  Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք մոտենում ենք լեզվի էվոլյուցիային պատճառականության ոսպնյակի միջոցով, որպեսզի մոդելավորենք ոչ միայն այն, թե ինչպես են տարբեր բաշխման գործոնները կապված լեզվի փոփոխությունների հետ, այլ նաև այն, թե ինչպես են դրանք պատճառա In particular, we study slang, which is an informal language that is typically restricted to a specific group or social setting.  Մենք վերլուծում ենք սլենգ բառերի սեմանտիկ փոփոխությունը և հաճախականության փոփոխությունը և համեմատում ենք դրանք ստանդարտ, ոչ սլենգ բառերի հետ: Պատճառի հայտնաբերման և պատճառի հետևանքների մեթոդների միջոցով մենք չափում ենք բառի տիպի ազդեցությունը սեմանտիկ փոփոխությունների և հաճախականության փոփոխությունների վրա, ինչպես նաև նրա հարաբերությունները հաճախականության, պոլիզեմիայի և խոսքի մասի հետ: Մեր վերլուծությունը որոշ նոր հասկացություններ է տալիս լեզվի փոփոխության ուսումնասիրության մեջ, օրինակ, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սլենգ բառերը ավելի քիչ սեմանտիկ փոփոխություններ են անցնում, բայց հակված են ժամանակի ընթացքում ավելի մեծ հաճախականության փոփոխություններ ունեն', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች ዘወትር ለውጦችን ይሄዳሉ፤ እነዚህንም ለውጦች የሚያስቀድሙት ሥርዓቶች ገና የውይይት ጉዳይ ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የቋንቋ ልውውጤት በቋንቋ ልውጤት እናቀርባለን፣ የቋንቋ ልውጤት እንዴት እንደሚያካክሉ ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ በተለይም፣ ግንኙነት እናስተምራለን፣ ይህም በተለያዩ ጉባኤ ወይም ማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ ግንኙነት የተከለከለ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ የአስተናክል ለውጥ እና የቁጥጥር ቃሎችን መለወጥ እናስተያየዋለን እናስተያየዋለን እናሳውቃቸዋለን እናስማራለን፡፡ በአሰራዊ ግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ግንኙነት፣ የቃላት ዓይነት (እግር/ነጩ) ለዋጭነት እና የቁጥጥር ለዋጭት እና የቁጥጥር ግንኙነት፣ የፖሊሲሲ እና የንግግር ግንኙነት በማድረግ እናስመስክራለን፡፡ ትምህርታችን የቋንቋ መለወጥ ትምህርት ውስጥ አዲስ ዓይኖችን ያሳያል፣ ምሳሌ ቃላት የsemantic ለውጥ የሚያሳየው ነገር ግን በጊዜው የበለጠ ቁጥጥር ይሻላል፡፡', 'az': 'Dillər həmişə dəyişikliklərin başına gəlir, bu dəyişikliklərin altında olan mehanizmilər hələ də mübahisədir. Bu işdə, biz dil evriminə, dil dəyişikliklərinə növbənöv dağıtış faktörləri dil dəyişikliklərinə ilişkilərini modellərlə yaxınlaşdırırıq, lakin bunun necə olaraq təsir edirlər. Özellikle, biz slang öyrənirik, bu da əsas bir qrupa ya da sosyal qurğulara müəyyən edilən informal dildir. Biz semantik dəyişiklikləri və sıxınlıq sözlərin dəyişikliklərini analiz edir və onları standart sözlərinə qarşılaşdırırıq. Sebitli keşf və təsirli infeksiya teknikləri ilə, söz növünün (slang/nonslang) hər ikisinin semantik dəyişiklik və frekans dəyişikliklərinə, frekans, polysemiyyət və sözlərin bir hissəsi ilə əlaqəsini ölçürük. Bizim analizimiz dil dəyişikliklərinin təhsil edilməsində yeni fikirləri təmin edir, məsələn, sözlərin dəyişikliklərinin daha az semantik dəyişikliklərinə bənzəyirik, amma zamanında böyük frekans dəyişikliklərinə bənzəyirik.', 'bn': 'ভাষাগুলো ক্রমাগত পরিবর্তন চলছে এবং এই পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে যে মেকিনসমূহ এখনও বিতর্কের ব্যাপার হচ্ছে। এই কাজের মাধ্যমে আমরা ভাষা বিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে পৌঁছে যাচ্ছি যাতে তারা শুধুমাত্র ভাষা পরিবর্তনের সাথে কিভাবে বিভিন্ন বিতরণ কারণগু বিশেষ করে, আমরা স্লাঙ্ক পড়ি, যা একটি অবৈধ ভাষা, যা সাধারণত একটি নির্দিষ্ট গ্রুপ অথবা সামাজিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের সীমাবদ্ধ। আমরা সেমেন্টিক পরিবর্তন এবং স্লাঙ্ক শব্দের ফ্রেঞ্চ পরিবর্তন বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং সেগুলোর সাথে তুলনা করি স্ট্যান্ডার্ড, অন কারণ আবিষ্কার এবং কারণের অসুস্থ কৌশলের মাধ্যমে আমরা শব্দ টাইপের প্রভাব পরিমাপ করি (স্লাঙ্গ/অনলাঙ্গা) যেটি সেমেন্টিক পরিবর্তন এবং ফ্রায়েন্স পরিবর্তনের বিষয় আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ ভাষা পরিবর্তনের গবেষণায় কিছু নতুন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করেছে, যেমন আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে স্লাঙ্গ শব্দ কম সেম্পেন্টিক পরিবর্তন ঘটে', 'ca': "Les llengües estan fent canvis continus, i els mecanismes que subjacent aquests canvis encara són una qüestió de debat. En aquesta feina, ens aproximam de l'evolució del llenguatge a través de la lent de causalitat per modelar no només com diversos factors de distribució s'associen al canvi de llenguatge, sinó com la afecten causalment. In particular, we study slang, which is an informal language that is typically restricted to a specific group or social setting.  Anàlisim el canvi semàntic i el canvi de freqüència de paraules en slang i les comparam amb les de paraules estàndard sense slang. With causal discovery and causal inference techniques, we measure the effect that word type (slang/nonslang) has on both semantic change and frequency shift, as well as its relationship to frequency, polysemy and part of speech.  La nostra anàlisi proporciona algunes noves percepcions en l'estudi del canvi de llenguatge, per exemple, demostram que les paraules en língua passan menys canvis semàntics però tendeixen a tenir canvis de freqüències més grans al llarg del temps.", 'bs': 'Jezici stalno vode promjene, a mehanizami koji su pod ovim promjenama još uvijek su pitanje debata. U ovom poslu, približavamo evoluciji jezika kroz lense uzrokovanih uzrokovanih stvari kako bismo modelili ne samo kako različiti distribucijski faktori povezuju sa promjenom jezika, već kako su ga uzrokovali. Posebno, proučavamo slang, koji je neformalni jezik koji je obično ograničen na određenu grupu ili društvenu postavku. Analiziramo semantičku promjenu i promjenu frekvencije slaganja riječi i uspoređujemo ih sa standardnim, neslaznim riječima. Uz uzrokovane tehnike otkrića i uzrokovane infekcije, mjerimo učinak koji tip riječi (slang/nonslang) ima na semantičku promjenu i promjenu frekvencije, kao i njegovu vezu sa frekvencijom, polizmom i dio govora. Naša analiza pruža neke nove uvide u studiji promjene jezika, na primjer, pokazujemo da slanje riječi proizvode manje semantičke promjene, ali tendira imati veće promjene frekvencije tijekom vremena.', 'cs': 'Jazyky se neustále mění a mechanismy, které jsou základem těchto změn, jsou stále diskutovány. V této práci přistupujeme k jazykové evoluci objektivem kauzality, abychom modelovali nejen, jak různé distribuční faktory spojují se změnou jazyka, ale jak ji příčinně ovlivňují. Zejména studujeme slang, což je neformální jazyk, který je obvykle omezen na konkrétní skupinu nebo sociální prostředí. Analyzujeme sémantickou změnu a frekvenční posun slangových slov a porovnáváme je se standardními, nestavými slovy. Pomocí techniky kauzálního objevu a kauzálních inferencí měříme vliv, který má typ slova (slang/nonslang) na sémantickou změnu a frekvenční posun, stejně jako jeho vztah k frekvenci, polysémii a části řeči. Naše analýza poskytuje některé nové poznatky ve studiu jazykové změny, například ukazuje, že slangová slova procházejí méně sémantickými změnami, ale mají tendenci v průběhu času větší frekvenční posuny.', 'et': 'Keeled muutuvad pidevalt ja nende muutuste aluseks olevad mehhanismid on endiselt arutluse küsimus. Käesolevas töös läheneme keele evolutsioonile põhjuslikkuse läätse kaudu, et modelleerida mitte ainult seda, kuidas erinevad jaotusfaktorid seostuvad keele muutusega, vaid kuidas nad seda põhjuslikult mõjutavad. Eelkõige uurime slängi, mis on mitteametlik keel, mis on tavaliselt piiratud konkreetse grupi või sotsiaalse keskkonnaga. Analüüsime slängisõnade semantilist muutust ja sageduse muutust ning võrdleme neid standardsete mittekeelsõnade omadega. Põhjusliku avastamise ja põhjusliku järelduse meetoditega mõõdame sõnatüübi (släng/mittelangel) mõju nii semantilisele muutusele kui sageduse nihkele, samuti selle seost sageduse, polüseemia ja kõne osaga. Meie analüüs annab mõningaid uusi teadmisi keele muutuse uurimiseks, näiteks näitame, et slängisõnad muutuvad vähem semantiliselt, kuid kipuvad aja jooksul sageduse muutusi suurenema.', 'fi': 'Kielet muuttuvat jatkuvasti, ja näiden muutosten taustalla olevista mekanismeista keskustellaan edelleen. Tässä työssä lähestymme kielen evoluutiota kausaalisuuden linssin kautta mallintaaksemme paitsi sitä, miten erilaiset jakautumistekijät liittyvät kielen muutokseen, myös sitä, miten ne kausaalisesti vaikuttavat siihen. Erityisesti tutkimme slangia, joka on epävirallinen kieli, joka on tyypillisesti rajoitettu tiettyyn ryhmään tai sosiaaliseen ympäristöön. Analysoimme slangisanojen semanttista muutosta ja taajuuden muutosta ja vertaamme niitä tavallisiin, ei-kielisiin sanoihin. Syy- ja syy-päättelytekniikoilla mitataan sanatyypin (slangi/ei-langi) vaikutusta sekä semanttiseen muutokseen että taajuuden muutokseen sekä sen suhdetta taajuuteen, polysemiaan ja puheen osaan. Analyysimme tarjoaa uusia oivalluksia kielen muutoksen tutkimiseen, esimerkiksi osoitamme, että slangisanat muuttuvat vähemmän semanttisesti, mutta niillä on yleensä suurempia taajuusmuutoksia ajan myötä.', 'jv': 'Languages Awak dhéwé éntuk karo nggawe evolusyon an luwih-luwih sabanjuré kelas nggawe winih dhéwé kuwi bisa model sing bisa perusahaan ajeng-ajeng kanggo ngerasakno luwih apik, lan uwis sakjane jewèké nggawe gerakan sakjane kuwi. Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé ngerasah slang, iki luwih pakan-pakan kuwi nggawe gerakan kelompok sing nggawe gerakan karo nggawe komunisi. Awak dhéwé dadi karo semanti kuwi bagian karo cah-cah kuwi duluran gambar lan soko nggawe kuwi padha awak dhéwé Standard, Gak dhéwé Ngawe Perintaha dolanan gambar deweke nglakoni soko dolanan karo teknik sing koyok nggambar kelas (slang/nonslang) iki dadi seneng dolanan semanti karo perusahaan karo perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno dadi, terakhir, polisemi lan pating langutan. Ndeleksé awak dhéwé éné beraksi perdidaké anyar in g nggawe gerambut karo urip kuwi, dadi, awak dhéwé menehi kuwi nggawe ujaran gambarang semanti kuwi mau, dadi mau ngelarang turuné kuwi nggawe ujaran ujaran.', 'sk': 'Jeziki se nenehno spreminjajo, mehanizmi, ki temeljijo na teh spremembah, pa so še vedno predmet razprave. V tem delu pristopamo k jezikovni evoluciji skozi lečo vzročnosti, da bi modelirali ne le, kako se različni distribucijski dejavniki povezujejo s spremembo jezika, ampak kako vzročno vplivajo nanjo. Zlasti preučujemo sleng, ki je neformalen jezik, ki je običajno omejen na določeno skupino ali družbeno okolje. Analiziramo semantično spremembo in frekvenčni premik slengovih besed in jih primerjamo s standardnimi, nejezikovnimi besedami. S tehnikami vzročnega odkrivanja in vzročnega sklepanja merimo učinek, ki ga ima tip besede (sleng/neslang) na semantično spremembo in frekvenčni premik, pa tudi njegovo povezavo s frekvenco, polisemijo in delom govora. Naša analiza ponuja nekaj novih vpogledov v preučevanje jezikovnih sprememb, npr. pokažemo, da sleng besede doživljajo manj semantičnih sprememb, vendar imajo večje frekvenčne spremembe sčasoma.', 'he': 'לשפות עוברות שינויים ממשיכים, והמנגנונים שמסמכים על השינויים האלה עדיין עניין של דיון. בעבודה הזו, אנו מתקרבים לאבולוציה בשפה דרך עדשת הסיבות כדי לדוגמא לא רק איך גורמים פיצוצים שונים מתחברים לשינוי שפה, אלא איך הם משפיעים בגלל זה. In particular, we study slang, which is an informal language that is typically restricted to a specific group or social setting.  אנו מנתחים את השינוי הסמנטי והשינוי התדירות של מילים סלנג ושוואים אותם לאלה של מילים סטנדרטיות, לא סלנג. עם גילוי סיבה וטכניקות סיבה, אנחנו ממדידים את ההשפעה שסוג המילה (slang/nonslang) יש על שינוי סמנטי ושינוי תדירות, כמו גם מערכת היחסים שלה לתדר, פוליזמיה וחלק מהנאום. Our analysis provides some new insights in the study of language change, e.g., we show that slang words undergo less semantic change but tend to have larger frequency shifts over time.', 'ha': "Languages are continuously undergoing changes, and the mechanisms that underlie these changes are still a matter of debate.  Daga wannan aikin, Munã kusantar da uzalisar harshe a bayan misalin mutane dõmin ka motsar kwamfyutan jinsi masu buƙata masu haɗi da musanya na harshen, kuma amma jinin da suke shagala shi. Kayyai, munã karatun cuta, wannan harshe ne da ba'a rasmi ba, wanda ana ƙunsa zuwa wani jama'a ko wani muhimmi na jami. Ana rarraba musanya na musanya na'ura da sauran magana, kuma Munã samfansa da waɗancan kalmõmi na daidaita. To, idan an gane, ko kuma masu saba da aikin kafin da za'a saba, za'a ƙayyade muhimmin maganar (ƙanshin/abun) yana da musanya na mutane da mutane da mutane, da kuma yana da danganta zuwa misfi, Polsemi da rabon magana. Anambayinmu yana da wasu gannai sãbuwa a cikin muhallin musanyawa na harshen, misali, muna nũna wa maganar goyi masu ƙari da musanyi na semantiki kuma yana da sauri masu ƙaranci ga mutane a lokaci.", 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་འཕེལ་རིམ་ལ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་མིན་པར། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་slang སློབ་བརྩོན་བྱེད་དགོས་མིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཞིག་ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཁང་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་འགོད ང་ཚོས་རྟགས་ཀྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དང་མཐའ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཀྱི་ཡི་གེ་ལ་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་བསམ་ཚུལ་དང་འབྱུང་བའི་དབྱེ་རིག་དག་ལ་ངེད་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་(slang/nonslang)རིགས་ཀྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དང་མཉམ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་དག་དུ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Does Recommend-Revise Produce Reliable Annotations? An Analysis on Missing Instances in ', 'ar': 'الارتباطات الزائفة في التقييم الخالي من المراجع لتوليد النص', 'es': 'Correlaciones falsas en la evaluación sin referencias de la generación de textos', 'fr': "Corrélations erronées dans l'évaluation sans référence de la génération de texte", 'pt': 'Correlações espúrias na avaliação sem referência de geração de texto', 'ja': 'テキスト生成のリファレンスフリー評価における偽の相関関係', 'hi': 'पाठ पीढ़ी के संदर्भ-मुक्त मूल्यांकन में नकली सहसंबंध', 'ru': 'Ложные корреляции при оценке генерации текста без ссылки', 'zh': '文本生无参考评估之虚联', 'ga': 'Comhghaolta Spéireacha i Meastóireacht Saor ó Thagairt ar Ghiniúint Téacs', 'ka': 'ტექსტის წარმოქმების რეფერენციის თავისუფალი განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Ανιχνευτικές συσχετίσεις στην αξιολόγηση της δημιουργίας κειμένου χωρίς αναφορά', 'hu': 'A szöveggeneráció referencia-mentes értékelésében a szöveggeneráció habos korrelációk', 'kk': 'Мәтін құрылғысының сілтемесіз бос оқу үшін жылдамдық түзетулері', 'it': 'Correlazioni spurie nella valutazione senza riferimento della generazione di testo', 'lt': 'Nuorodų neturinčio teksto gamybos vertinimo koreliacijos', 'mk': 'Спурозни корелации во проценката на генерацијата на текст без референција', 'ms': 'Korelasi Berlebihan dalam Evaluasi Jenerasi Teks Bebas Rujukan', 'ml': 'പദാവലി ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള റെഫറന്\u200dസ്- സ്വതന്ത്രമായ പരിശോധനത്തിലുള്ള വിശിഷ്ടമായ ബന്ധങ്', 'mt': 'Korelazzjonijiet Spuriużi fl-Evalwazzjoni tal-Ġenerazzjoni tat-Test mingħajr Referenza', 'mn': 'Текст төрөлхтний үнэгүй үнэлгээ дэвшүүлэх шаардлагатай', 'pl': 'Niestabilne korelacje w ocenie bezreferencyjnej generowania tekstu', 'no': 'Ekstra korreksjonar i evaluering av tekstgenerering frå referansen', 'sr': 'Šperne korekcije u procjeni generacije teksta bez referencije', 'ro': 'Corelații spurioase în evaluarea fără referință a generării textului', 'si': 'පාළුව නිර්මාණයේ ස්පුරියෝජනය සඳහා ස්පුරියෝ සුදුසුම් විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Furnish xiriir in Reference-Free Evaluation of Text Generation', 'sv': 'Spurious Correlations in Referensfri Evaluation of Text Generation', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'تفصیل پیدا کرنے کی نسبت بغیر منفی ارزیابی میں سفارشی اصلاح', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Liên hoàn hảo trong môi trường Đánh giá văn bản miễn nhiễm.', 'bg': 'Спуриозни корелации при безреферентна оценка на генерирането на текст', 'da': 'Spurious Correlations in Reference-Free Evaluation of Text Generation', 'hr': 'Hrabre korekcije u procjeni generacije teksta bez referencije', 'nl': 'Sporige correlaties in referentievrije evaluatie van tekstgeneratie', 'de': 'Spuröse Korrelationen bei der referenzfreien Auswertung der Textgenerierung', 'fa': 'تغییرات سرعتی در ارزیابی نسل متن آزاد', 'id': 'Korelasi Spurious dalam Evaluasi Bebas Referensi dari Generasi Teks', 'ko': '참고 문헌 텍스트 생성 평가에서의 허위 관련 없음', 'sw': 'Mahusiano mazuri katika Uthibitisho wa Uzalishaji wa Mataifa', 'tr': 'Metin Dönüşiniň Çykyşyrlygynda Sürekli Doňurlyklar', 'sq': 'Spurious Correlations in Reference-Free Evaluation of Text Generation', 'af': 'Speurde Korreksies in Verwysing- Vry Evaluering van Teks Generasie', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'M…ôtn M…ôxluqatƒ±nƒ±n Referens-Free Assessment', 'bn': 'টেক্সট জেনারেশনের ফ্রি মূল্যায়নের মধ্যে সুন্দর সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্ক', 'bs': 'Šperne korekcije u procjeni generacije teksta bez referencije', 'cs': 'Špatné korelace v bezreferenčním hodnocení tvorby textu', 'ca': "Correlacions espurioses en l'Evaluació de la generació de text sense referències", 'et': 'Rõhuvad korrelatsioonid tekstiloomise viitevabas hindamises', 'fi': 'Röyhkeät korrelaatiot tekstintuotannon viitevapaassa arvioinnissa', 'sk': 'Spurious Correlations in Reference-Free Evaluation of Text Generation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Spanish', 'bo': 'Spurious Correlations in Reference-Free Evaluation of Text Generation', 'he': 'שיתופים עצומים בהערכה ללא רמזים של יצירת טקסט'}
{'en': 'DocRED is a widely used dataset for document-level relation extraction. In the large-scale annotation, a recommend-revise scheme is adopted to reduce the workload. Within this scheme, annotators are provided with candidate relation instances from distant supervision, and they then manually supplement and remove relational facts based on the recommendations. However, when comparing DocRED with a subset relabeled from scratch, we find that this scheme results in a considerable amount of false negative samples and an obvious bias towards popular entities and relations. Furthermore, we observe that the models trained on DocRED have low recall on our relabeled dataset and inherit the same bias in the training data. Through the analysis of annotators’ behaviors, we figure out the underlying reason for the problems above: the scheme actually discourages annotators from supplementing adequate instances in the revision phase. We appeal to future research to take into consideration the issues with the recommend-revise scheme when designing new models and annotation schemes. The relabeled dataset is released at https://github.com/AndrewZhe/Revisit-DocRED, to serve as a more reliable test set of document RE models.', 'ar': 'مقاييس التقييم المستندة إلى النموذج والخالية من المراجع\nتم اقتراحه باعتباره وسيلة سريعة وفعالة من حيث التكلفة\nنهج لتقييم توليد اللغة الطبيعية\n(NLG) أنظمة. على الرغم من الواعدة الأخيرة\nالنتائج ، نجد دليلًا على أنه خالٍ من المراجع\nمقاييس التقييم للتلخيص والحوار\nقد يكون التوليد يعتمد على الزيف\nالارتباطات بمقاييس مثل تداخل الكلمات ،\nالحيرة والطول. نلاحظ كذلك\nلتلخيص النص ، فإن هذه المقاييس\nمعدلات خطأ عالية عند ترتيب الحالة الحالية\nنظم التلخيص التجريدي الفني. نحن\nإثبات أن هذه الأخطاء يمكن التخفيف منها\nمن خلال تصميم مقاييس التقييم بشكل صريح\nتجنب الميزات الزائفة في التقييم الخالي من المراجع.', 'pt': 'Métricas de avaliação baseadas em modelo e sem referência\nforam propostos como uma solução rápida e econômica\nabordagem para avaliar a geração de linguagem natural\n(NLG). Apesar das promessas recentes\nresultados, encontramos evidências de que\nmétricas de avaliação de sumarização e diálogo\ngeração pode estar confiando em espúrios\ncorrelações com medidas como sobreposição de palavras,\nperplexidade e comprimento. Observamos ainda\nque para sumarização de texto, essas métricas têm\naltas taxas de erro ao classificar o estado atual da\nsistemas de sumarização abstrativos da arte. Nós\ndemonstrar que esses erros podem ser mitigados\nao projetar explicitamente métricas de avaliação para\nevite recursos espúrios na avaliação sem referência.', 'fr': "Mesures d'évaluation basées sur des modèles et sans référence\nont été proposés comme une solution rapide et rentable\napproche pour évaluer la génération du langage naturel\n(GNL). Malgré des récents prometteurs\nrésultats, nous trouvons des preuves que sans référence\nmesures d'évaluation de synthèse et de dialogue\ngénération peut s'appuyer sur de faux\ncorrélations avec des mesures telles que le chevauchement de mots,\nla perplexité et la longueur. Nous observons en outre\nque pour la synthèse de texte, ces métriques ont\ntaux d'erreur élevés lors du classement de l'état actuel\nsystèmes de synthèse abstraite d'art. Nous\ndémontrer que ces erreurs peuvent être atténuées\nen concevant explicitement des mesures d'évaluation\névitez les fonctionnalités fallacieuses lors d'une évaluation sans référence.", 'ja': 'モデルベース、リファレンスフリーの評価指標\n高速で費用対効果の高い製品として提案されている\n自然言語生成を評価するアプローチ\n(NLG)システム。最近有望であるにもかかわらず\n結果として、私たちは参照がないという証拠を見つけます\n要約とダイアログの評価指標\n世代はスプリアスに頼っているかもしれない\nワードオーバーラップなどのメジャーとの相関、\n複雑さと長さをさらに観察します\nテキストの要約については、これらの指標は\n現在の状態をランク付けするときの高いエラー率\n抽象芸術のまとめシステム.\nこれらのエラーを軽減できることを実証しています\n評価指標を明示的に設計して\nリファレンスフリー評価における偽の機能を回避する。', 'zh': '基于模形、无参指标\n已被议为速而有成本效益\n评估自然语言生之法\n(NLG) 系统。 虽近有望\n卒无参证\n总结与对话的评估指标\n生成赖虚\n与度量直(如单词叠) 之相关性。\n困惑长度。 吾更观之\n其于文本摘要,指标有之\n排名出错率高\n艺术抽象总结系统。 我等\n明可以解之\n因显式设计评估指标\n免于无参评虚征。', 'hi': 'मॉडल-आधारित, संदर्भ-मुक्त मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक\nएक तेज और लागत प्रभावी के रूप में प्रस्तावित किया गया है\nप्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए दृष्टिकोण\n(एनएलजी) प्रणालियों। हाल ही में वादा करने के बावजूद\nपरिणाम, हम सबूत पाते हैं कि संदर्भ मुक्त\nसारांशीकरण और संवाद के मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स\nपीढ़ी नकली पर निर्भर हो सकती है\nशब्द ओवरलैप जैसे उपायों के साथ सहसंबंध,\nउलझन, और लंबाई। हम आगे निरीक्षण करते हैं\nकि पाठ summarization के लिए, इन मैट्रिक्स है\nउच्च त्रुटि दरों जब रैंकिंग वर्तमान स्थिति की-\nकला अमूर्त summarization प्रणालियों. हम\nप्रदर्शित करें कि इन त्रुटियों को कम किया जा सकता है\nस्पष्ट रूप से मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स डिजाइन करके\nसंदर्भ मुक्त मूल्यांकन में नकली सुविधाओं से बचें।', 'es': 'Métricas de evaluación sin referencias y basadas en modelos\nse han propuesto como una solución rápida y rentable\nenfoque para evaluar la generación de lenguaje natural\n(NLG). A pesar de las promesas\nresultados, encontramos evidencia de que sin referencia\nmétricas de evaluación de resumen y diálogo\ngeneración puede estar confiando en espurios\ncorrelaciones con medidas como la superposición de palabras,\nperplejidad y longitud. Observamos además\nque para el resumen de texto, estas métricas tienen\naltas tasas de error al clasificar el estado actual de\nsistemas de resumen abstractivo de arte. Nosotros\ndemostrar que estos errores se pueden mitigar\ndiseñando explícitamente métricas de evaluación para\nevite las características espurias en la evaluación sin referencias.', 'ru': 'Метрики оценки, основанные на модели\nи не содержащие ссылок были предложены в качестве быстрого и эффективного с точки зрения затрат\nподход к оценке генерации естественного языка\n(NLG). Несмотря на многообещающие недавние\nрезультаты, мы находим доказательства того, что ссылки не\nоценочные показатели суммирования и диалога\nпоколение может полагаться на ложные\nкорреляции с такими показателями, как перекрытие слов,\nнедоумение и длину. Мы далее наблюдаем\nчто для обобщения текста эти метрики имеют\nвысокая частота ошибок при ранжировании текущего состояния\nсистемы абстрактного обобщения искусства. Мы\nдемонстрируем, что эти ошибки могут быть смягчены\nявно разрабатывая метрики оценки для\nизбегать ложных признаков при оценке без ссылок.', 'ga': "Méadracht mheastóireachta múnla-bhunaithe, saor ó thagairtí\nmolta mar bhealach tapa agus cost-éifeachtach\ncur chuige chun Giniúint Teanga Nádúrtha a mheas\n(NLG). In ainneoin gealltanais le déanaí\ntorthaí, feicimid fianaise atá saor ó thagairtí\nméadracht mheastóireachta ar achoimre agus dialóg\nd'fhéadfadh giniúint a bheith ag brath ar sporúil\ncomhghaolta le bearta amhail forluí focal,\nperplexity, agus fad. Breathnaímid a thuilleadh\ngur le haghaidh achoimre téacs, tá na méadrachta\nrátaí arda earráide agus staid reatha an lae á rangú\ncórais achoimre ealaíne teibí. muid\nléiriú gur féidir na hearráidí seo a mhaolú\ntrí mhéadracht mheastóireachta a dhearadh go sainráite\nseachain gnéithe spíonta sa mheastóireacht gan tagairt.", 'el': 'Μετρητές αξιολόγησης βασισμένες σε μοντέλα χωρίς αναφορά', 'it': 'Metriche di valutazione basate su modelli, senza riferimento', 'hu': 'Modellalapú, referencia-mentes értékelési mutatók', 'kk': 'Үлгі негізделген, сілтеме бос оқу метрикалары', 'ka': 'მოდელთან დაბათებული, რეფერენტის გაუმუშავებელი მეტრიკი', 'ms': 'Metrik penilaian berdasarkan model, bebas rujukan', 'mk': 'Метрика за проценка базирана на модел, без референција', 'ml': 'മോഡല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ, റെഫന്\u200dസ്- സ്വതന്ത്രമായ evaluation മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Загвар-суурилсан, reference-free evaluation metrics', 'no': 'Modellbasert, referansfri evalueringsmetrikar', 'pl': 'Oparte na modelu, bezreferencyjne wskaźniki oceny', 'lt': 'Pavyzdžiu pagrįsti, etaloniniai vertinimo metriniai rodikliai', 'ro': 'Valori de evaluare bazate pe modele, fără referință', 'mt': 'Metriki ta’ evalwazzjoni bbażati fuq mudell, mingħajr referenza', 'sr': 'Метрика за оценку на моделу, без референтне оценке', 'sv': 'Modellbaserade, referensfria utvärderingsmetoder', 'ur': 'Model-based, reference-free evaluation metrics', 'ta': 'மாதிரி அடிப்படையிலான, reference-free evaluation metrics', 'so': 'Midabka qiimeynta lacag la’aanta ah', 'si': 'මොඩල් අධාරිත, ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය නිදහස් විශ්ලේෂණ මීටරික්', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô- đun dựa trên, đo hồ sơ', 'bg': 'Базирани на модели, без референтни показатели за оценка', 'hr': 'Metarija na osnovu modela, bezreferentnih procjena', 'da': 'Modelbaserede, referencefrie evalueringsmålinger', 'de': 'Modellbasierte, referenzfreie Bewertungsmetriken', 'id': 'Metrik evaluasi berdasarkan model, tanpa referensi', 'ko': '모델에 기초하고 참고가 없는 평가 지표', 'sw': 'mbinu za kutathmini bure za maoni', 'tr': 'nusgala', 'af': 'Model-gebaseerde, verwysing-vry evaluering metries', 'nl': 'Modelgebaseerde, referentievrije evaluatiestatistieken', 'sq': 'Metrikat e vlerësimit të bazuar në modele, pa referencë', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Մոդելի հիմնված, անհամեմատական գնահատման չափումները', 'az': 'Model-based, reference-free evaluation metrics', 'fa': 'متریک ارزیابی با مدل، آزاد ارزیابی', 'ca': "Mètriques d'evaluació basades en models sense referència", 'bn': 'মডেল ভিত্তিক, রেফারেন্স-ফ্রি মুক্তি মেট্রিক', 'bs': 'Na modelu bazirane metrike za procjenu bez referencije', 'cs': 'Metriky hodnocení založené na modelech bez referencí', 'et': 'Mudelipõhised viitevabad hindamismeetodid', 'fi': 'Mallipohjaiset, viitevapaat arviointimittarit', 'he': 'מטריות עריכה מבוססת על מודל, ללא התייחסות', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'Metric-zaÉ“en cire-inganci na motel', 'sk': 'Meritve ocenjevanja, ki temeljijo na modelih, brez referenc', 'bo': 'Model-based, reference-free evaluation metrics'}
{'en': 'An Empirical Study of Memorization in NLP', 'pt': 'Sobre os ingredientes de um analisador semântico eficaz de tiro zero', 'ar': 'عن مكونات المحلل اللغوي الفعال ذي اللقطة الصفرية', 'fr': "Sur les ingrédients d'un analyseur sémantique Zero-shot efficace", 'es': 'Sobre los ingredientes de un analizador semántico eficaz de tiro cero', 'ja': '効果的なゼロショットセマンティックパーサーの成分について', 'ru': 'О компонентах эффективного семантического анализатора с нулевым выстрелом', 'hi': 'एक प्रभावी शून्य-शॉट सिमेंटिक पार्सर की सामग्री पर', 'zh': '论有效者镜头语义解析器分', 'ga': 'Ar na Comhábhair a bhaineann le Parsálaí Séimeantach Neamh-urchar Éifeachtach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Σχετικά με τα συστατικά ενός αποτελεσματικού σημασιολογικού αναλυτή μηδενικού πυροβολισμού', 'hu': 'Egy hatékony nulla lövéses szemantikus parser összetevőiről', 'it': 'Gli ingredienti di un efficace parser semantico a colpo zero', 'kk': 'Эффективті нөл- сүрлеу семантикалық ескертуші', 'mk': 'За состојките на ефективен семантичен анализатор со нула снимка', 'lt': 'Veiksmingo nulinio poveikio Semantinio analizatoriaus sudedamosios dalys', 'ms': 'Pada Ingredien Penjana Semantik Semantik Efektif', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Dwar l-Ingredjenti ta’ Parser Semantiku Effettiv b’Qtugħ Żero', 'mn': 'Эффектив Нөлөөлөгч Зөлөөлөгчийн эцэг эхчүүдийн', 'pl': 'O składnikach efektywnego zerowo-strzałowego parsera semantycznego', 'ro': 'Despre Ingredientele unui Parser Semantic Eficient Zero-shot', 'no': 'På ingredienten av ein effektiv nullstatt semantisk foreldar', 'sr': 'Na sastojke učinkovitog semantičkog roditelja nula pucnjave', 'si': 'The ingredient of an Efctive Zero-shot semantic ParserName', 'so': 'On the Ingients of an Effective Zero-shot Semantic Parser', 'sv': 'Om Ingredienserna i en effektiv nollskott semantisk parser', 'ta': 'வெளிப்படையான செமாண்டிக் பார்சரின் பொருள்களில்', 'ur': 'ایک اثرات صفر-شٹ سیمنٹی پارچر کے ذریعے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Về các thành phần của chế độ kỳ lạ hiệu quả.', 'bg': 'За съставките на ефективен семантичен анализ с нулев изстрел', 'hr': 'Na sastojke učinkovitog semantičkog roditelja nula pucnjave', 'da': 'Om ingredienserne i en effektiv nulskud semantisk parser', 'nl': 'Over de ingrediënten van een effectieve zero-shot semantische parser', 'de': 'Über die Inhaltsstoffe eines effektiven Zero-Shot Semantischen Parsers', 'fa': 'روی عناصره\u200cهای یک پدر و مادربزرگ صفر فعالی', 'id': 'Pada Ingredien dari Penganalis Semantik Efektif Zero-shot', 'ko': '효과적인 영포 의미 분석기의 구성 요소', 'af': "Op die Ingredients van 'n Effektiewe Nuwe- skoot Semantiese Verander", 'sw': 'Kuhusu Kiingereza cha Mbunge wa Semantic Zero aliyepigwa risasi', 'tr': 'Efektiv bir 0-atly atasy üçin katylar', 'sq': 'Për përbërësit e një analizuesi Semantik efektiv zero-shot', 'az': 'Efektiv Sƒ±fƒ±r-atlƒ± Semantik √úst…ôlik √úst…ôlik', 'am': 'በ ፀሐይ-ነጥብ ሳማቲክ ፓርስር ላይ', 'hy': 'Էֆեկտիվ զրո-կրակի սեմանտիկ վերլուծողի բաղադրիչների վրա', 'bn': 'একটি প্রভাবিক জিরো গুলি সেম্যান্টিক পার্সারের ইঞ্জিনিজেন্ট', 'bs': 'Na sastojke učinkovitog semantičkog roditelja nula pucnjave', 'cs': 'O složkách efektivního sémantického parseru Zero-shot', 'ca': 'En The Ingredients of an Effective Zero-shot Semantic Parser', 'et': 'Tõhusa null-shot semantilise parser koostisosade kohta', 'fi': 'Tehokkaan nollashotin semanttisen parserin ainesosista', 'sk': 'O sestavinah učinkovitega Zero-shot semantičnega razčlenjevalnika', 'ha': 'On the Ingent of an Effective Zero-shot Semantic Parser', 'he': 'על המרכיבים של מפרסם סמנטי אפקטיבי', 'bo': 'Efficient Zero-shot semantic parenting་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་པ', 'jv': 'deep'}
{'en': 'A recent study by Feldman proposed a long tail theory to explain the memorization behavior of deep learning models However memorization has not been empirically verified in the context of NLP a gap addressed by this work In this paper we use three different NLP tasks to check if the long tail theory holds Our experiments demonstrate that top ranked memorized training instances are likely atypical and removing the top memorized training instances leads to a more serious drop in test accuracy compared with removing training instances randomly Furthermore we develop an attribution method to better understand why a training instance is memorized We empirically show that our memorization attribution method is faithful and share our interesting finding that the top memorized parts of a training instance tend to be features negatively correlated with the class label', 'es': 'Los analizadores semánticos mapean las expresiones del lenguaje natural en representaciones de significado (por ejemplo, programas). Por lo general, estos modelos se ven obstaculizados por la escasez de datos de entrenamiento debido a los laboriosos esfuerzos de anotación necesarios. Estudios recientes han llevado a cabo un aprendizaje cero al sintetizar ejemplos de entrenamiento de enunciados canónicos y programas a partir de una gramática, y parafraseando aún más estos enunciados para mejorar la diversidad lingüística. Sin embargo, estos ejemplos sintéticos no pueden capturar completamente los patrones en datos reales. En este artículo analizamos analizadores zero-shot a través de los lentes del lenguaje y las brechas lógicas (Herzig y Berant, 2019), que cuantifican la discrepancia del lenguaje y los patrones programáticos entre los ejemplos canónicos y los emitidos por los usuarios del mundo real. Proponemos cerrar estas brechas mediante gramáticas mejoradas, paráfrasis más fuertes y métodos de aprendizaje eficientes utilizando ejemplos canónicos que probablemente reflejen las intenciones reales de los usuarios. Nuestro modelo logra un rendimiento sólido en dos puntos de referencia de análisis semántico (Scholar, Geo) sin datos etiquetados.', 'pt': 'Os analisadores semânticos mapeiam enunciados de linguagem natural em representações de significado (por exemplo, programas). Esses modelos são normalmente limitados pela escassez de dados de treinamento devido aos trabalhosos esforços de anotação necessários. Estudos recentes têm realizado aprendizado de tiro zero sintetizando exemplos de treinamento de enunciados e programas canônicos de uma gramática e parafraseando ainda mais esses enunciados para melhorar a diversidade linguística. No entanto, esses exemplos sintéticos não podem capturar totalmente os padrões em dados reais. Neste artigo, analisamos os analisadores zero-shot através das lentes da linguagem e das lacunas lógicas (Herzig e Berant, 2019), que quantificam a discrepância de linguagem e padrões programáticos entre os exemplos canônicos e os emitidos pelo usuário do mundo real. Propomos preencher essas lacunas usando gramáticas aprimoradas, paráfrases mais fortes e métodos de aprendizado eficientes usando exemplos canônicos que provavelmente refletem as intenções reais do usuário. Nosso modelo alcança forte desempenho em dois benchmarks de análise semântica (Scholar, Geo) com zero dados rotulados.', 'ar': 'يقوم المحلل اللغوي بتخطيط النطق اللغوي الطبيعي في تمثيلات المعنى (على سبيل المثال ، البرامج). عادةً ما يتم اختناق هذه النماذج بسبب ندرة بيانات التدريب بسبب جهود التعليقات التوضيحية الشاقة المطلوبة. لقد أجرت الدراسات الحديثة عملية تعلُّم خاسرة من خلال تجميع أمثلة تدريبية للألفاظ والبرامج الكنسية من القواعد ، وإعادة صياغة هذه الأقوال لتحسين التنوع اللغوي. ومع ذلك ، لا يمكن لمثل هذه الأمثلة التركيبية أن تلتقط الأنماط بالكامل في البيانات الحقيقية. في هذه الورقة ، نحلل موزعي الأصوات الصفرية من خلال عدسات اللغة والفجوات المنطقية (هيرزيغ وبرانت ، 2019) ، والتي تحدد التباين في اللغة والأنماط البرمجية بين الأمثلة المتعارف عليها والأمثلة الواقعية التي يصدرها المستخدم. نقترح سد هذه الفجوات باستخدام قواعد نحوية محسّنة ، وأدوات إعادة صياغة أقوى ، وأساليب تعلم فعالة باستخدام أمثلة أساسية تعكس على الأرجح نوايا المستخدم الحقيقية. يحقق نموذجنا أداءً قويًا في مقياسين للتحليل الدلالي (الباحث العلمي ، والجغرافي) مع عدم وجود بيانات معنونة.', 'fr': "Les analyseurs sémantiques mappent les énoncés du langage naturel en représentations de signification (par exemple, des programmes). De tels modèles sont généralement bloqués par la rareté des données d'apprentissage en raison des efforts d'annotation laborieux nécessaires. Des études récentes ont permis de réaliser un apprentissage sans coup en synthétisant des exemples de formation d'énoncés canoniques et de programmes à partir d'une grammaire, et en paraphrasant ces énoncés afin d'améliorer la diversité linguistique. Cependant, de tels exemples synthétiques ne peuvent pas saisir complètement les tendances dans des données réelles. Dans cet article, nous analysons les analyseurs zero-shot à travers le prisme du langage et des lacunes logiques (Herzig et Berant, 2019), qui quantifient l'écart entre les modèles de langage et de programmation entre les exemples canoniques et ceux du monde réel publiés par les utilisateurs. Nous proposons de combler ces lacunes en utilisant des grammaires améliorées, des paraphrases plus solides et des méthodes d'apprentissage efficaces utilisant des exemples canoniques qui reflètent très probablement les intentions réelles des utilisateurs. Notre modèle atteint de bonnes performances sur deux benchmarks d'analyse sémantique (Scholar, Geo) avec des données zéro étiquetées.", 'ja': '意味構文解析器は、自然言語の発話を意味表現（例えば、プログラム）にマッピングする。 このようなモデルは、通常、必要とされる手間のかかる注釈作業に起因するトレーニングデータの不足によってボトルネックになっている。 最近の研究では、文法から正準発話とプログラムのトレーニング例を合成し、言語の多様性を向上させるためにこれらの発話をさらに言い換えることによって、ゼロショット学習が行われている。 しかしながら、そのような合成例は、実データ内のパターンを完全に捉えることはできない。 この論文では、言語と論理的ギャップのレンズを通してゼロショット構文解析器を分析します（ Herzig and Berant, 2019 ）。これは、典型的な例と実際のユーザーが発行した例との間の言語とプログラムパターンの相違を定量化します。 私たちは、改善された文法、より強力なパラフレーズ、そして実際のユーザーの意図を最も反映する可能性の高い正準例を使用した効率的な学習方法を使用して、これらのギャップを埋めることを提案します。 当社のモデルは、ラベル付けされたデータをゼロにして、2つのセマンティック解析ベンチマーク（ Scholar、Geo ）で強力なパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'zh': '语义解析器以自然语言语映义示(,序)中。 因注事,常以乏练数为瓶颈。 近者讲求语法训示例,更释之以善言多样性,而行零镜头学焉。 然此类合成示例不能尽得真数之式。 本文以言语与逻辑相去视角析零镜头解析器(Herzig与Berant,2019)量化规模示例与世界用户发示例语言编程式之异。 臣等议用改进之语法,愈强释义效之学以弥合之,其用最有可见用户意示例。 二语义解析准(Scholar,Geo)成强大,而无纪数。', 'hi': 'शब्दार्थ पार्सर प्राकृतिक भाषा के उच्चारण को अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (जैसे, कार्यक्रमों) में मैप करते हैं। इस तरह के मॉडल आमतौर पर आवश्यक श्रमसाध्य एनोटेशन प्रयासों के कारण प्रशिक्षण डेटा की कमी से बाधित होते हैं। हाल के अध्ययनों ने व्याकरण से विहित कथनों और कार्यक्रमों के प्रशिक्षण उदाहरणों को संश्लेषित करके शून्य-शॉट सीखने का प्रदर्शन किया है, और भाषाई विविधता में सुधार करने के लिए इन कथनों को आगे बढ़ाया है। हालांकि, इस तरह के सिंथेटिक उदाहरण वास्तविक डेटा में पैटर्न को पूरी तरह से कैप्चर नहीं कर सकते हैं। इस पेपर में हम भाषा और तार्किक अंतराल (हर्ज़िग और बेरेंट, 2019) के लेंस के माध्यम से शून्य-शॉट पार्सर का विश्लेषण करते हैं, जो विहित उदाहरणों और वास्तविक दुनिया के उपयोगकर्ता-जारी किए गए लोगों के बीच भाषा और प्रोग्रामेटिक पैटर्न की विसंगति को निर्धारित करते हैं। हम बेहतर व्याकरण, मजबूत पैराफ्रेजर, और विहित उदाहरणों का उपयोग करके कुशल सीखने के तरीकों का उपयोग करके इन अंतरालों को पाटने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो सबसे अधिक संभावना वास्तविक उपयोगकर्ता इरादों को प्रतिबिंबित करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल शून्य लेबल डेटा के साथ दो शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग बेंचमार्क (विद्वान, जियो) पर मजबूत प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Семантические парсеры отображают высказывания на естественном языке в представления смысла (например, программы). Такие модели, как правило, ограничены из-за нехватки учебных данных из-за требуемых трудоемких усилий по аннотированию. Недавние исследования проводили обучение с нулевым выстрелом, синтезируя обучающие примеры канонических высказываний и программ из грамматики и далее перефразируя эти высказывания для улучшения языкового разнообразия. Однако такие синтетические примеры не могут в полной мере отражать закономерности в реальных данных. В данной работе мы анализируем парсеры с нулевым выстрелом через линзы языка и логические разрывы (Herzig and Berant, 2019), которые количественно оценивают несоответствие языка и программных паттернов между каноническими примерами и реальными пользовательскими. Мы предлагаем устранить эти пробелы, используя улучшенные грамматики, более сильные парафрейзеры и эффективные методы обучения, используя канонические примеры, которые, скорее всего, отражают реальные намерения пользователей. Наша модель достигает высокой производительности на двух семантических эталонах синтаксического анализа (Scholar, Geo) с нулевыми маркированными данными.', 'ga': 'Déanann parsálaithe shéimeantacha nathanna cainte nádúrtha a mapáil isteach i léiriú brí (m.sh. cláir). Go hiondúil bíonn a leithéid de mhúnlaí ag bagairt ar ghanntanas na sonraí oiliúna mar gheall ar na hiarrachtaí diana anótála. Rinne staidéir a rinneadh le déanaí an fhoghlaim ar neamhní trí shamplaí oiliúna de chainteanna canónacha agus de chláir ó ghramadach a shintéisiú, agus na briathra sin a athinsint tuilleadh chun éagsúlacht teanga a fheabhsú. Mar sin féin, ní féidir le samplaí sintéiseacha dá leithéid patrúin a ghabháil go hiomlán i bhfíorshonraí. Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid anailís ar pharsálaithe gan urchar trí lionsaí na teanga agus na bearnaí loighciúla (Herzig agus Berant, 2019), a dhéanann an neamhréireacht teanga agus patrúin ríomhchláraithe a chainníochtú idir na samplaí canónacha agus na cinn a eisítear don úsáideoir sa saol fíor. Tá sé beartaithe againn na bearnaí seo a líonadh trí úsáid a bhaint as gramadaí feabhsaithe, paraphrasers níos láidre, agus modhanna éifeachtacha foghlama ag baint úsáide as samplaí canónacha a léiríonn fíor-intinn an úsáideora, is dócha. Baineann ár múnla feidhmíocht láidir amach ar dhá thagarmharc parsála shéimeantach (Scoláire, Geo) le nialas sonraí lipéadaithe.', 'hu': 'A szemantikus elemzők a természetes nyelv kifejezéseit jelentésképviseletekké térképezik fel (pl. programok). Az ilyen modelleket jellemzően szűk keresztmetszetbe helyezi a képzési adatok hiánya a szükséges fáradságos jegyzetelési erőfeszítések miatt. A közelmúltbeli tanulmányok nulla lövéses tanulást végeztek azzal, hogy szintetizálták a kanonikus kifejezések és programok képzési példáit a nyelvtani sokszínűség javítása érdekében. Az ilyen szintetikus példák azonban nem tudják teljes mértékben rögzíteni a mintákat a valós adatokban. Jelen tanulmányban a nyelvi és logikai rések lencséin keresztül analizáljuk a nulla-shot elemzőket (Herzig és Berant, 2019), amelyek számszerűsítik a nyelv és a programozási minták eltérését a kanonikus és a valós felhasználók által kiadott példák között. Javasoljuk, hogy ezeket a hiányosságokat áthidaljuk továbbfejlesztett nyelvtanfolyamok, erősebb parafrázók és hatékony tanulási módszerek segítségével olyan kanonikus példákkal, amelyek valószínűleg tükrözik a valódi felhasználói szándékokat. Modellünk két szemantikai elemzési referenciaértéken (Scholar, Geo) erős teljesítményt ér el nullával jelölt adatokkal.', 'el': 'Οι σημειακοί αναλυτές χαρτογραφούν τις εκφράσεις φυσικής γλώσσας σε αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών (π.χ. προγράμματα). Τέτοια μοντέλα συνήθως περιορίζονται από την έλλειψη δεδομένων κατάρτισης λόγω των απαιτούμενων επίπονης προσπαθειών σχολιασμού. Πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν πραγματοποιήσει μηδενική μάθηση με τη σύνθεση εκπαιδευτικών παραδειγμάτων κανονικών προφορών και προγραμμάτων από μια γραμματική, και περαιτέρω παράφραση αυτών των προφορών για τη βελτίωση της γλωσσικής πολυμορφίας. Ωστόσο, τέτοια συνθετικά παραδείγματα δεν μπορούν να συλλάβουν πλήρως πρότυπα σε πραγματικά δεδομένα. Στην παρούσα εργασία αναλύουμε τους αναλυτές μηδενικού πυροβολισμού μέσα από τους φακούς της γλώσσας και των λογικών κενών (Χέρζιγκ και Μπέραντ, 2019), οι οποίοι ποσοτικοποιούν τη διαφορά της γλώσσας και των προγραμματικών προτύπων μεταξύ των κανονικών παραδειγμάτων και των πραγματικών χρηστών που εκδίδονται. Προτείνουμε τη γεφύρωση αυτών των κενών χρησιμοποιώντας βελτιωμένες γραμματικές, ισχυρότερους παραφράκτες και αποτελεσματικές μεθόδους μάθησης χρησιμοποιώντας κανονικά παραδείγματα που πιθανότατα αντικατοπτρίζουν πραγματικές προθέσεις των χρηστών. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ισχυρή απόδοση σε δύο σημασιολογικούς δείκτες ανάλυσης (μελετητής, γεω) με μηδενικά επισημασμένα δεδομένα.', 'ka': 'Semantic parsers map natural language utterances in meaning representations (e.g. programs). ასეთი მოდელები, რომლებიც უნდა მუშაობელია მონაცემების დაკავშირება. შემდეგ კვლევები ნულ სტრიქტის სწავლებას გავაკეთეთ, რომელიც კონონიკალური სიტყვების და პროგრამების მაგალითების სტრიქტირებით და დამატებით ამ სიტყვების სტრიქტირებით,  მაგრამ ასეთი სინტეტიკური მაგალითები არ შეუძლიათ ყველაფერი მონაცემებში ჩატვირთვა. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ ნულ სტატის პარასერების სიტყვის და ლოგიკური განსხვავების ლინზებით (Herzig და Berant, 2019), რომლებიც კვანტიფიკურებენ ენის და პროგრამიკური მონაცემების განსხვავებას კანონიკური მაგალითან ჩვენ გვეძლევა, რომ ამ განტოლებების შესაძლებლობად გავამუშაოთ, უფრო ძალიან პარაფრაზერების გამოყენება და ეფექტიური სწავლების მეტოვების გამოყენება კანონიკური მაგალითების გამოყენ ჩვენი მოდელი ძალიან გამოყენება ორი სიმენტიკური პანქმენტიკური ბანქმერი (სკოლარი, გეო) და ნული მარტიკური მონაცემებით.', 'it': 'I parser semantici mappano le espressioni del linguaggio naturale in rappresentazioni di significato (ad esempio, programmi). Tali modelli sono tipicamente strozzati dalla scarsità di dati di formazione a causa dei laboriosi sforzi di annotazione richiesti. Studi recenti hanno eseguito un apprendimento zero-shot sintetizzando esempi di formazione di parole canoniche e programmi da una grammatica, e parafrasando ulteriormente queste parole per migliorare la diversità linguistica. Tuttavia, tali esempi sintetici non possono catturare completamente i modelli nei dati reali. In questo articolo analizziamo i parser zero-shot attraverso le lenti del linguaggio e dei gap logici (Herzig e Berant, 2019), che quantificano la discrepanza di linguaggio e schemi programmatici tra gli esempi canonici e quelli reali emessi dagli utenti. Proponiamo di colmare queste lacune utilizzando grammatiche migliorate, parafrasori più forti e metodi di apprendimento efficienti utilizzando esempi canonici che molto probabilmente riflettono reali intenzioni degli utenti. Il nostro modello raggiunge prestazioni elevate su due benchmark di analisi semantica (Scholar, Geo) con dati etichettati zero.', 'mk': 'Семантичките анализатори ги мапираат изразите на природниот јазик во значење претставувања (на пример, програми). Таквите модели обично се загрозени од недостатокот на податоци за обука поради потребните напори за напорни анотации. Неодамнешните студии спроведоа нула-стрелка учење со синтезирање на примери за обука на канонички изрази и програми од граматика, и понатаму парафразирање на овие изрази за подобрување на јазичната различност. Сепак, вакви синтетички примери не можат целосно да ги фатат шемите во реалните податоци. Во оваа хартија анализираме нулта снимка на анализирачите преку очите на јазикот и логичните празнини (Херциг и Берант, 2019), кои ја квантификуваат дискрепантноста на јазикот и програмските шеми помеѓу каноничните примери и оние издадени од корисниците во вистинскиот свет. Предлагаме да ги преминеме овие празнини користејќи подобрени граматики, посилни парафразери и ефикасни методи на учење користејќи канонички примери кои најверојатно ги одразуваат вистинските намери на корисникот. Нашиот модел постигнува силни резултати на два семантични параметри за анализирање (Scilar, Geo) со нула обележани податоци.', 'kk': 'Semantic parsers map natural language words into meaning (e.g. programs). Бұл үлгілер кәдімгі қажетті жұмыс белгілердің күшелігі үшін оқыту деректерінің қауіпсіздігі өтеді. Жуырдағы зерттеулердің бағдарламалардың бағдарламалардың бағдарламалардың синтезациялау үшін нөл-шат оқытуын жасады. Бұл сөздерді тілдік түрліктерін жақсарту үшін бұл сөздерді басқа пар Бірақ бұл синтетикалық мысалдар шын деректерде үлгілер толық түсірілмейді. Бұл қағазда біз нөл түрлі талдаушыларды тіл және логикалық кеңістіктерді (Herzig және Berant, 2019) линзияларынан анализ етеміз. Бұл тіл және бағдарламалық үлгілер арасындағы каноникалық мысалдар мен шын әлемді пайдаланушылардың Біз бұл заттарды жақсы грамматтарды, күшті парафразтарды қолдануға және кәдімгі оқыту әдістерін кәдімгі пайдаланушылардың мақсаттарын көрсетуге болады. Біздің үлгіміз екі semantic parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) дегенде нөл белгіленген деректерді қолдану үшін күшті жұмыс істейді.', 'lt': 'Semantic parsers map natural language utterances into meaning representations (e.g., programs).  Tokie modeliai paprastai susiduria su mokymo duomenų trūkumu dėl reikalingų darbo užrašų. Pastaraisiais tyrimais buvo atliktas nulinis mokymasis sintetizuojant kanoninių žodžių ir programų iš gramatikos mokymo pavyzdžius ir toliau parafrazuojant šiuos žodžius siekiant pagerinti kalbinę įvairovę. Tačiau tokie sintetiniai pavyzdžiai negali visiškai įtraukti modelių į tikruosius duomenis. Šiame dokumente analizuojame nulinio nuotraukos analizatorius per kalbos sklaidytuvus ir logiškas spragas (Herzig ir Berant, 2019 m.), kurie kiekybiškai įvertina kalbos ir programinių modelių skirtumą tarp kanonikos pavyzdžių ir tikrojo pasaulio vartotojų išduotų. Siūlome pašalinti šias spragas naudojant geresnes gramatikas, stipresnius parafrazės ir veiksmingus mokymosi metodus naudojant kanoniškus pavyzdžius, kurie labiausiai atspindi tikrus vartotojų ketinimus. Mūsų modelis pasiekia didelius rezultatus dviejuose semantiniuose analizavimo kriterijuose (moksleivis, Geo), kuriuose nėra žymėtų duomenų.', 'ms': 'Penghurai Semantik memetakan ungkapan bahasa semulajadi menjadi perwakilan makna (cth., program). Such models are typically bottlenecked by the paucity of training data due to the required laborious annotation efforts.  kajian baru-baru ini telah dilakukan pembelajaran senjata dengan menyintesis contoh pelatihan ucapan canonical dan program dari grammar, dan lebih lanjut parafrasa ucapan ini untuk meningkatkan pelbagai bahasa. Namun, contoh sintetik seperti ini tidak dapat menangkap corak sepenuhnya dalam data sebenar. Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis penghurai tembakan sifar melalui lensa bahasa dan ruang logik (Herzig dan Berant, 2019), yang mengurangi ketidakpadanan bahasa dan corak programmatik antara contoh canonical dan yang diberikan oleh pengguna dunia nyata. Kami cadangkan mengatasi ruang-ruang ini dengan menggunakan grammar yang lebih baik, parafraser yang lebih kuat, dan kaedah pembelajaran efisien menggunakan contoh kanonik yang paling mungkin mencerminkan niat pengguna sebenar. Model kami mencapai prestasi yang kuat pada dua tanda benchmark penghuraian semantik (Scholar, Geo) dengan data berlabel sifar.', 'ml': 'സെമാന്\u200dറിക് പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷകളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളായി മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണത്തിന ഇത്തരം മോഡലുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള്ള ശ്രമത്തിന്റെ ശ്രമങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രശ്നം സാധാരണ അടുത്തുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഗ്രാമാരില്\u200d നിന്നും കാനോണിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രോഗ്രാമുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഉപമകള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിച് എങ്കിലും ഇത്തരം സങ്കീര്\u200dത്തിക ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും പിടി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷയും ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഷകളുമായ പാര്\u200dസറുകളുടെ (ഹെര്\u200dസിഗും ബെരാന്റ്, 2019) ലെന്\u200dസുകളുമായി ശൂന്യമായി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഭാഷ, പ്രോഗ്രാമിക്കല്\u200d മാതൃക കാനോണിക്കല്\u200d ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട ഗ്രാമ്മാര്\u200d, ശക്തിയുള്ള പാരാഫ്രാഫര്\u200dസ്സുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് മുന്\u200dപ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്ന രണ്ട് ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d ശക്തമായ പ്രദര്\u200dശനം നേടുന്നു. പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വ', 'mn': 'Semantic parsers map natural language words into meaning representations (e.g. programs). Эдгээр загварууд ихэвчлэн хэрэгтэй ажиллагааны сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шаардлагатай болохоор суралцах өгөгдлийн бус байдалд хязгаарлагддаг. Саяхан судалгаанууд грамматаас хичээлийн үг болон программын жишээ болон суралцах хичээлийн сургалтыг зохион байгуулсан бөгөөд хэлний олон зүйлсийг улам сайжруулахын тулд эдгээр үг илэрхийлэлцүүлсэн. Гэвч ийм синтетик жишээ нь бодит өгөгдлийн загваруудыг бүрэн нь барьж чадахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэл болон логикийн зай (Herzig, Berant, 2019) линзийг 0 шат хуваалцагчдыг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Энэ нь хэл болон програм загварын ялгааг хэмжээний жишээ болон жинхэнэ ертөнцийн хэрэглэгчийн хэрэглэгчдийн хоорондын хуваалцааны ялгааг Бид эдгээр заагуудыг сайжруулсан грамм, илүү хүчтэй парафразуудыг ашиглаж, үнэндээ хэрэглэгчдийн зорилгоог илэрхийлж чадахгүй газрын жишээг ашиглаж чадна. Бидний загварын загвар нь хоёр semantic parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) дээр 0 тэмдэглэгдсэн мэдээллээр хүчтэй ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Semantiske tolkarar karterer naturspråk- uttrykk i meiningar (f.eks. program). Desse modeller vert vanlegvis uttrykket av treningsdata på grunn av dei nødvendige arbeidsområda. Nyleg har studier utført null-skjultlæring ved å syntisera eksemplar for trening av kanoniske uttrykk og programmer frå eit grammar, og framover parafrasera desse uttrykkene for å forbetra linguistiske mangfold. Dette syntetiske eksemplar kan imidlertid ikkje fullstendig henta mønsterelement i verkeleg data. I denne papiret analyserer vi nullstiller gjennom lensene av språk og logiske mellomrom (Herzig og Berant, 2019), som kvantifiserer forskjellighet på språk og programmønsterene mellom dei kanoniske eksemplane og verkeleg brukarar. Vi foreslår å bryta desse mellomroma med forbetra grammar, sterke parafraserar og effektivne læringsmetoder ved hjelp av kanoniske eksemplar som mest sannsynlegvis reflekserer verkelege brukarhendingar. Modellen vårt gjer sterk utvikling på to semantiske analyseringsbenchmarker (Scholar, Geo) med null merket data.', 'pl': 'Parsery semantyczne mapują wypowiedzi języka naturalnego na reprezentacje znaczenia (np. programy). Takie modele są zazwyczaj wąskie gardło przez brak danych treningowych ze względu na wymagane pracowite wysiłki adnotacyjne. Ostatnie badania przeprowadziły zero-shot uczenie się, syntezując przykłady treningowe wypowiedzi kanonicznych i programów z gramatyki, a następnie parafrazując te wypowiedzi w celu poprawy różnorodności językowej. Jednak takie syntetyczne przykłady nie mogą w pełni uchwycić wzorców w rzeczywistych danych. W niniejszym artykule analizujemy parsery zero-shot przez soczewki językowe i logiczne luki (Herzig i Berant, 2019), które ilościowo określają rozbieżność języka i wzorców programowych między przykładami kanonicznymi a rzeczywistymi wydanymi przez użytkowników. Proponujemy wypełnienie tych luk za pomocą ulepszonych gramatyk, silniejszych parafrazów i efektywnych metod uczenia się przy użyciu przykładów kanonicznych, które najprawdopodobniej odzwierciedlają realne intencje użytkowników. Nasz model osiąga wysoką wydajność na dwóch wskaźnikach analizy semantycznej (Scholar, Geo) z zerowymi znakowanymi danymi.', 'ro': 'Analizoarele semantice mapează expresiile limbajului natural în reprezentări de sens (de exemplu, programe). Astfel de modele sunt, de obicei, blocate de lipsa datelor de formare din cauza eforturilor laborioase de adnotare necesare. Studiile recente au efectuat o învățare zero-shot prin sintetizarea exemplelor de formare a cuvintelor și programelor canonice dintr-o gramatică și parafrazarea ulterioară a acestor cuvinte pentru a îmbunătăți diversitatea lingvistică. Cu toate acestea, astfel de exemple sintetice nu pot capta pe deplin modele în date reale. În această lucrare analizăm parserele zero-shot prin lentilele lacunelor lingvistice și logice (Herzig și Berant, 2019), care cuantifică discrepanța dintre limbaj și modelele programatice dintre exemplele canonice și cele emise de utilizatori din lumea reală. Propunem eliminarea acestor lacune folosind gramatici îmbunătățite, parafrazori mai puternici și metode eficiente de învățare folosind exemple canonice care, cel mai probabil, reflectă intențiile reale ale utilizatorilor. Modelul nostru obține performanțe puternice pe două criterii de analizare semantică (Scholar, Geo) cu date etichetate zero.', 'sr': 'Semantički parseri mapiraju prirodne govore jezika u značajne predstave (npr. programe). Takvi modeli su obično oštećeni nedostatkom podataka o obuci zbog potrebnih napora radnih annotacija. Nedavno proučavanje provelo je učenje od nule šanse sintezirajući primjere obuke kanoničkih govora i programa iz gramatike, i dalje parafrazirajući te reči kako bi poboljšala jezičku raznolikost. Međutim, takvi sintetički primjeri ne mogu potpuno uhvatiti obrasce u pravim podacima. U ovom papiru analiziramo praznike nule pucnjave kroz lense jezika i logičkih praznina (Herzig i Berant, 2019), koji kvantificiraju diskreciju jezika i programskih obrazaca između kanoničkih primjera i izvođenih korisnika na stvarnom svijetu. Predlažemo da prebacimo ove praznine koristeći poboljšane gramare, jače parafraze i efikasne metode učenja koristeći kanoničke primjere koje najverovatnije odražavaju prave namere korisnika. Naš model postiže jaku izvedbu na dva semantička analiza (škola, Geo) sa nulom označenim podacima.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් පරීක්ෂකයෝ ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව කියන්න අදහස් කරනවා (උදාහරණය, වැඩසටහන්). මේ මෝඩේල් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම බෝට්ලන් කරලා තියෙන්නේ අවශ්\u200dය වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන දත්ත අලුත් පරීක්ෂණාවල් සුන්ධ විදියට සුන්ධ විදියට ඉගෙනගන්න සුන්ධ විදියට සුන්ධ විදියට සුන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා  නමුත්, ඒ වගේ සංවේදනය උදාහරණය ඇත්තම දත්තේ තියෙන පොඩ්ඩර් අල්ලගන්න බෑ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ශූර්ය විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා භාෂාව සහ ලෝකික විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා (හෙර්සිග් සහ බෙරැන්ට්, 2019) භාෂාව සහ ප්\u200dරොග්රාමේටික විශේෂ කරනවා කැ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ විශාල විශ්වාස කරන්න, වඩා ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික්ෂණ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දෙකක් ගැන (ස්කූලාර්, ජෝයා) ලේබෙල් ත', 'so': 'Jardiinooyinka Semantic ku qoran karta hadallada afka dabiiciga ah waxay u jeedaan wakiilada (tusaale. programyada). Sida caadiga ah tusaalooyinkaas waxaa lagu daboolaa taariikhda waxbarashada sababtoo ah dhibaatooyin loo baahan yahay. Waxbarashada la soo dhowaaday waxay sameyn jireen tusaale ahaan waxbarasho oo la wada-baranayo hadalka kanonika iyo barnaamijyada lagu qoray grammar, waxaana lagu sii sheegay hadalladan si ay u hagaajiyaan kala duduwan luuqadaha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaalooyin caynkaas ah laguma qabsan karo tusaalooyin rasmi ah. Qoraalkan baaritaanka aan zero lagu dhuftay ayaannu ku analyeynaa sawirada luqada iyo heerarka la xiriira (Herzig iyo Berant, 2019), kaas oo qiimeynaya iskuulka luuqada iyo qaababka programka ee u dhexeeya tusaalaha kanonika iyo isticmaalaha caalamka ah ee runta ah. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan isku dayno gafafkan si fiican loo isticmaalo grammar, qalabka aad u xoogaysan, iyo qaababka waxbarashada oo faa’iido leh oo lagu isticmaalayo tusaalaha kanonika ah oo ugu macquul ah inay ka fikiraan waxyaabaha runta ah ee isticmaalayaasha. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu si xoog leh u helaa labada bangiyadood oo semantic ah (School, Geo) oo lagu qoray macluumaad zero ah.', 'sv': 'Semantiska tolkare kartlägger naturligt språkuttryck till betydelserepresentationer (t.ex. program). Sådana modeller är vanligtvis flaskhalsade av bristen på utbildningsdata på grund av de mödosamma annotationsansträngningarna. Nyligen genomförda studier har utfört noll-skott lärande genom att syntetisera utbildningsexempel på kanoniska yttranden och program från en grammatik, och ytterligare parafrasera dessa yttranden för att förbättra språklig mångfald. Sådana syntetiska exempel kan dock inte helt fånga mönster i verkliga data. I denna uppsats analyserar vi noll-shot parsers genom linserna i språk och logiska luckor (Herzig och Berant, 2019), som kvantifierar skillnaden mellan språk och programmatiska mönster mellan kanoniska exempel och verkliga användarutgivna. Vi föreslår att överbrygga dessa luckor med hjälp av förbättrade grammater, starkare parafrasers och effektiva inlärningsmetoder med hjälp av kanoniska exempel som sannolikt återspeglar verkliga användarintentioner. Vår modell uppnår stark prestanda på två semantiska analysriktmärken (Scholar, Geo) med nollmärkta data.', 'mt': 'Semantic parsers map natural language utterances into meaning representations (e.g., programs).  Dawn il-mudelli huma tipikament imxekkla mill-faqar tad-dejta tat-taħriġ minħabba l-isforzi meħtieġa ta’ annotazzjoni tax-xogħol. Studji reċenti wettqu tagħlim mingħajr skop billi sintetizzaw eżempji ta’ taħriġ ta’ dikjarazzjonijiet u programmi kanoniċi minn gramma, u parafrazzaw aktar dawn it-dikjarazzjonijiet biex itejbu d-diversità lingwistika. Madankollu, eżempji sintetiċi bħal dawn ma jistgħux jaqbdu b’mod sħiħ xejriet fid-dejta reali. F’dan id-dokument nagħmlu analiżi tal-analizzaturi żero-shot permezz tal-lentijiet tal-lingwa u l-lakuni loġiċi (Herzig u Berant, 2019), li jikkwantifikaw id-diskrepanza tal-lingwa u l-mudelli programmatiċi bejn l-eżempji kanoniċi u dawk maħruġa mill-utenti fid-dinja reali. Aħna qed nipproponu li jingħelbu dawn in-nuqqasijiet bl-użu ta’ grammi mtejba, parafrażizzaturi aktar b’saħħithom, u metodi effiċjenti ta’ tagħlim bl-użu ta’ eżempji kanoniċi li x’aktarx jirriflettu l-intenzjonijiet reali tal-utenti. Il-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni qawwija fuq żewġ punti ta’ riferiment semantiċi tal-analiżi (Scholar, Geo) b’dejta żero ttikkettata.', 'ta': 'செமாண்டிக் பார்சர்கள் இயல்பான மொழியின் வார்த்தைகளை அர்த்தமான பிரதிநியோகங்களுக்கு (உதாரணமாக, நிரல்கள்). இந்த மாதிரிகள் பொதுவாக பயிற்சி தரவின் குறைவாக குறைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது தேவைப்படும் வேலை அறிவிப்பு முயற்சிகள சமீபத்தில் படிப்புகள் பூஜ்ஜியமாக கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ளது ஒரு வரிசையில் இருந்து கானோனிக் சொல்லுகள் மற்றும் நிரல்களின் பயிற்சி உதாரணங்களை ஒன்றிண ஆனால், இவ்வாறு கூட்டிணைப்பு உதாரணங்கள் உண்மையான தரவில் முழுமையாக பிடிக்க முடியாது. In this paper we analyze zero-shot parsers through the lenses of the language and logical gaps (Herzig and Berant, 2019), which quantify the discrepancy of language and programmatic patterns between the canonical examples and real-world user-issued ones.  மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட வரைப்படங்கள், வலிமையான அளபுருக்கள், மற்றும் கானோனிக் உதாரணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி செயல்படுத்தும் முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி  நம்முடைய மாதிரி சுட்டியிடப்பட்ட தரவுடன் இரண்டு பெமான்டிக் பாக்கியம் கூடிய செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی پارسرسر طبیعی زبان کلمات کی مثال کے مطابق نمونات میں نقشه بناتے ہیں (جیسے پروگرام). ایسے نمونے معمولاً دکھانے کی کمزوری کے ذریعہ سے دکھانے والی دکھانے والی تلاش کی وجہ سے دکھائی جاتی ہیں. اچھی مطالعہ کی صفر-شٹ کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کی مثالیں سنٹیسی کر دی گئی ہیں، اور ان کلمات کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کی مثالیں سنٹیسی کر دی گئی ہیں، اور ان کلمات کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کے لئے اضافہ کرتی ہے. However, such synthetic examples cannot fully capture patterns in real data. ہم اس کاغذ میں صفر-شٹ پارسروں کو زبان اور منطقی فاصلے کے لینس سے تحقیق کرتے ہیں (Herzig اور Berant, 2019) جو زبان اور پروگرامیک پٹرنوں کے اختلاف کو کانونیک مثالوں اور واقعی دنیا کے استعمال کرنے والوں کے درمیان مقدار کرتا ہے۔ ہم ان فضاؤں کو سفارش دیتے ہیں جن کے مطابق بہترین گرامر، قوی پارافرزر اور قابل تعلیم طریقے کے مطابق کانونیک مثالیں استعمال کرتے ہیں جو بہت زیادہ شاید واقعی کارساز کے مطابق تفصیل دیتے ہیں. ہماری مدل دو سیمنٹی پارسینگ بنچم مارک (Scholar, Geo) کے ذریعے صفر لکھی ہوئی ڈیٹا کے ساتھ مضبوط عملکرد حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu modellar odatda tajriba tajriba qilish kerak tajribalari uchun taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yordamida bog'liqlar. Yaqinda o'rganishlar grammatikan so'zlar va dasturlarni birlashtirish uchun hech narsa o'rganishni o'rganishni bajardi, va bu so'zlarni tillar tarqatishni o'zgartirish uchun bir necha o'rganishni bajaradi. Lekin, bunday syntetik misollari ҳақиқий maʼlumotdagi shakllarni butunlay olib tashlab boʻlmaydi. Bu takarda biz til va logical gaplar (Herzig va Berant, 2019) darajalari orqali hech narsa bo'lgan parserlarni analyzemiz. Bu tilning va programmatic modellarining o'rtasida o'zgarishni va haliy dunyo foydalanuvchilar orasidagi foydalanuvchilar orasidagi ta'limni aniqlaydi. Biz bu gaplarni yaxshi grammatika, yaxshi paraphraslardan foydalanishimiz va foydalanish usullarini foydalanishimiz kerak mumkin, haqiqiqiy foydalanuvchilar qandaydigan foydalanuvchilardan foydalanishi mumkin. Bizning modelimizning ikki semantik parsing parametrlarini (Maktab, Geo) notoʻgʻri maʼlumot bilan ishlaydi.", 'vi': 'Mẹ phân tích tinh dịch chia ra ngôn ngữ tự nhiên theo nghĩa của biểu tượng (v.v., chương trình). Một trong những một loại một loại hoàn toàn bị làm việc rất chận dựng bởi việc cung cấp thông tin. Các nghiên cứu gần đây đã thực hiện học không bắn bằng cách tổng hợp các ví dụ về ngôn ngữ và các chương trình từ ngữ pháp, và diễn tả thêm các từ ngữ pháp để cải thiện sự khác biệt ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, ví dụ tổng hợp này không thể nắm bắt hoàn toàn các mô hình trong dữ liệu thực. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi phân tích các phân tích phân tích phân tích các phân tích không bắn qua các thấu kính của ngôn ngữ và các khoảng trống logic (Herzig và Berant, 2009), để đo lượng sự khác biệt ngôn ngữ và biểu đồ giữa các trường mẫu giáo và các trường hợp người dùng phổ biến trên thế giới thực. Chúng tôi đề nghị kết thúc những khoảng trống bằng cách cải tiến các tạp chí, liệt kê mạnh hơn, và các phương pháp học hành hiệu quả, sử dụng các ví dụ điển hình phù hợp với mục đích thực sự. Mô hình của chúng tôi đạt được hiệu suất mạnh nhờ hai tiêu chuẩn phân tích theo ngữ nghĩa (Scholar, Geo) với chưa đánh dấu dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Семантичните анализатори картографират думите на естествения език в символни представи (напр. програми). Такива модели обикновено са затруднени от липсата на данни за обучение поради необходимите трудолюбиви усилия за анотация. Последните проучвания извършват нулево обучение чрез синтезиране на обучителни примери за канонични изказвания и програми от граматика и допълнително парафразиране на тези изказвания за подобряване на езиковото многообразие. Такива синтетични примери обаче не могат напълно да улавят модели в реални данни. В настоящата статия анализираме анализатори с нулев изстрел през обективите на езика и логическите пропуски (Херзиг и Берант, 2019), които количествено определят несъответствието на езиковите и програмните модели между каноничните примери и издадените от реалния свят потребители примери. Предлагаме преодоляване на тези пропуски с помощта на подобрени граматики, по-силни парафрази и ефективни методи за обучение, използвайки канонични примери, които най-вероятно отразяват реалните намерения на потребителите. Нашият модел постига силно представяне на две семантични параметри за анализ (Научен, Гео) с нулеви етикети данни.', 'hr': 'Semantički parseri mapiraju prirodne jezičke izraze u značajne predstave (npr. programe). Takvi modeli su obično oštećeni nedostatkom podataka obuke zbog potrebnih radnih napora za annotaciju. Nedavno ispitivanje provelo je učenje nula pucnjave sintezirajući primjere obuke kanoničkih govora i programa iz gramatike i daljnje parafrazirajući te govore kako bi se poboljšala jezička raznolikost. Međutim, takvi sintetički primjeri ne mogu potpuno uhvatiti obrasce u pravim podacima. U ovom papiru analiziramo praznike nula pucnjave kroz lense jezika i logičkih praznina (Herzig i Berant, 2019), koji kvantificiraju diskreciju jezika i programskih obrazaca između kanoničkih primjera i izvođenih korisnika na stvarnom svijetu. Predlažemo prebaciti te praznine koristeći poboljšane gramare, jače parafraze i učinkovite metode učenja koristeći kanoničke primjere koje najvjerojatnije odražavaju prave namjere korisnika. Naš model postiže jaku učinku na dvije semantičke kriterije analize (škola, Geo) s nulom označenim podacima.', 'da': 'Semantiske fortolkere kortlægger natursprogets udtalelser til meningsrepræsentationer (f.eks. programmer). Sådanne modeller er typisk flaskehalse på grund af manglen på træningsdata på grund af de krævede besværlige noteringsbestræbelser. Nylige undersøgelser har udført zero-shot læring ved at syntetisere træningseksempler på kanoniske udtalelser og programmer fra en grammatik, og yderligere omskrivning af disse udtalelser for at forbedre sproglig mangfoldighed. Sådanne syntetiske eksempler kan imidlertid ikke fuldt ud fange mønstre i reelle data. I denne artikel analyserer vi nul-shot parsere gennem linserne af sprog og logiske huller (Herzig og Berant, 2019), som kvantificerer uoverensstemmelsen mellem sprog og programmatiske mønstre mellem kanoniske eksempler og virkelige brugerudstedte eksempler. Vi foreslår at bygge bro over disse huller ved hjælp af forbedrede grammatier, stærkere parafrasere og effektive læringsmetoder ved hjælp af kanoniske eksempler, der sandsynligvis afspejler reelle brugerhensigter. Vores model opnår stærk ydeevne på to semantiske parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) med nul mærkede data.', 'nl': "Semantische parsers brengen natuurlijke taaluitingen in betekenisrepresentaties (bijv. programma's) in kaart. Dergelijke modellen worden meestal belemmerd door het gebrek aan trainingsgegevens als gevolg van de vereiste moeizame annotatie inspanningen. Recente studies hebben zero-shot learning uitgevoerd door trainingsvoorbeelden van canonieke uitspraken en programma's uit een grammatica te synthetiseren, en deze uitspraken verder te parafraseren om de taaldiversiteit te verbeteren. Dergelijke synthetische voorbeelden kunnen echter geen patronen volledig vastleggen in echte gegevens. In dit artikel analyseren we zero-shot parsers door de lenzen van de taal en logische hiaten (Herzig en Berant, 2019), die de discrepantie tussen taal en programmatische patronen kwantificeren tussen de canonieke voorbeelden en real-world gebruikers uitgegeven voorbeelden. We stellen voor om deze hiaten te overbruggen met behulp van verbeterde grammatica's, sterkere parafrasers en efficiënte leermethoden met behulp van canonieke voorbeelden die hoogstwaarschijnlijk de werkelijke bedoelingen van gebruikers weerspiegelen. Ons model bereikt sterke prestaties op twee semantische parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) met nul gelabelde gegevens.", 'de': 'Semantische Parser bilden natﾃｼrliche Sprachﾃ､uﾃ歹rungen in Bedeutungsreprﾃ､sentationen (z.B. Programme) ab. Solche Modelle sind typischerweise durch den Mangel an Trainingsdaten aufgrund des erforderlichen mﾃｼhsamen Annotationsaufwands engmaschig. Jﾃｼngste Studien haben Zero-Shot-Lernen durchgefﾃｼhrt, indem sie Trainingsbeispiele kanonischer ﾃеﾃ歹rungen und Programme aus einer Grammatik synthetisierten und diese ﾃеﾃ歹rungen weiter paraphrasierten, um die sprachliche Vielfalt zu verbessern. Solche synthetischen Beispiele kﾃｶnnen jedoch Muster in realen Daten nicht vollstﾃ､ndig erfassen. In diesem Beitrag analysieren wir Zero-Shot Parser durch die Linsen der Sprache und logischer Lﾃｼcken (Herzig und Berant, 2019), die die Diskrepanz von Sprache und programmatischen Mustern zwischen den kanonischen Beispielen und realen Anwendern quantifizieren. Wir schlagen vor, diese Lﾃｼcken mit verbesserten Grammatiken, stﾃ､rkeren Paraphrasern und effizienten Lernmethoden zu ﾃｼberbrﾃｼcken, indem wir kanonische Beispiele verwenden, die hﾃｶchstwahrscheinlich reale Nutzerintentionen widerspiegeln. Unser Modell erzielt eine starke Performance auf zwei semantischen Parsing-Benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) mit null markierten Daten.', 'ko': '의미 분석기는 자연 언어의 말을 의미 표시(예를 들어 프로그램)로 비춘다.필요한 주석 작업이 훈련 데이터의 부족을 초래하기 때문에 이런 모델은 통상적으로 제한을 받는다.최근의 연구는 문법에서 언어와 절차를 종합적으로 규범화하는 훈련 예시를 종합하고 이를 해석함으로써 언어의 다양성을 높여 제로 사격 학습을 실현했다.그러나 이런 합성 예는 실제 데이터의 패턴을 완전히 포착할 수 없다.본고에서 우리는 언어와 논리적 결함(Herzig과 Berant, 2019)의 시각을 통해 제로포 해석기를 분석했는데 이것은 규범 예시와 실제 세계 사용자가 발표한 예시 간의 언어와 프로그래밍 모델 차이를 양적으로 분석했다.우리는 개선된 문법, 더욱 강한 해석, 그리고 실제 사용자의 의도를 반영할 수 있는 규범 예시를 사용하는 효과적인 학습 방법을 사용하여 이러한 차이를 메울 것을 건의합니다.우리의 모델은 두 가지 의미 분석 기준(Scholar, Geo)에서 좋은 성능을 실현했고 표기 데이터가 없다.', 'fa': 'بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cهای سیماتیک زبان طبیعی را به معنی نمایش\u200cدهندگان (مثال برنامه\u200cها) نقشه می\u200cدهند. این مدلها معمولاً توسط فقیری از داده های آموزش به دلیل تلاش\u200cهای اذیت\u200cکننده\u200cای لازم دارند، به زبون می\u200cرسند. مطالعات اخیراً با استفاده از مثال آموزش\u200cهای کانونیکی و برنامه\u200cها از یک گرامی انجام داده\u200cاند، و این سخنرانی\u200cها را برای افزایش گوناگونی زبان\u200cشناسی پارافریز کردند. با این حال، این مثال\u200cهای سناتیک نمی\u200cتوانند الگوهای واقعی را کاملاً در داده\u200cهای واقعی بگیرند. در این کاغذ ما از طریق لینز\u200cهای زبان و فاصله\u200cهای منطقی (Herzig and Berant, 2019) بررسی\u200cکنندگان صفر را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که اختلاف زبان و نمونه\u200cهای برنامه\u200cای بین نمونه\u200cهای کانونیک و کاربر\u200cهای واقعی\u200cترین جهان را تعداد می\u200cدهند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که این فاصله\u200cها را با استفاده از گرامبر\u200cهای بهتر، پارافریزهای قوی\u200cتر و روش\u200cهای آموزش موثری با استفاده از مثال\u200cهای کانونیک استفاده کنیم که احتمالاً هدف\u200cهای کاربر واقعی را تفسیر می\u200cکند. مدل ما با اطلاعات صفر برگزار می\u200cشود، اجرای قوی در دو بررسی\u200cهای سنتی\u200cشناسی (دانشگاه، جئو) را می\u200cرساند.', 'id': 'Penganalis sementik memetakan ungkapan bahasa alami menjadi representation arti (contohnya, program). Model seperti ini biasanya terjebak oleh kekurangan data latihan karena usaha annotasi yang diperlukan. Studi-studi baru-baru ini telah melakukan pembelajaran tanpa tembakan dengan sintesis contoh pelatihan dari ucapan canonical dan program dari sebuah gramatika, dan lebih lanjut parafrasa ucapan-ucapan ini untuk meningkatkan kebanyakan bahasa. Namun, contoh sintetis seperti itu tidak bisa sepenuhnya menangkap pola dalam data nyata. Dalam kertas ini kami menganalisis parser zero-shot melalui lensa bahasa dan ruang logis (Herzig dan Berant, 2019), yang mengurangi ketidakcocokan bahasa dan pola programmatis antara contoh canonik dan yang diberikan oleh pengguna dunia nyata. Kami mengusulkan untuk mengatasi celah-celah ini dengan menggunakan grammar yang lebih baik, parafraser yang lebih kuat, dan metode belajar efisien menggunakan contoh canonik yang paling mungkin mencerminkan niat pengguna nyata. Our model achieves strong performance on two semantic parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) with zero labeled data.', 'sw': 'Wabunge wa kimapenzi wanaramani hotuba za lugha za asili kwa maana ya kuwakilisha (kwa mfano programu). Mfano huu mara nyingi huchapishwa na upungufu wa taarifa za mafunzo kutokana na jitihada zinazohitajika za kutosha kazi. Tafiti za hivi karibuni zimekuwa zikifanya kujifunza kwa sifa kwa kukusanyika kwa mifano ya mafunzo ya maneno na programu za kanonia kutoka kwenye karatasi, na kuelezea maneno haya ili kuboresha utofauti wa lugha. Hata hivyo, mifano kama hii ya pamoja hayawezi kuingia mifano katika takwimu halisi. Katika gazeti hili tunachambua mabunge wasiopigwa risasi sifa kupitia mistari ya lugha na tofauti za kisiasa (Herzig na Berant, 2019), ambayo hupima utofauti wa lugha na mifano ya programu kati ya mifano ya kanoni na watumiaji wa dunia halisi. We propose bridging these gaps using improved grammars, stronger paraphrasers, and efficient learning methods using canonical examples that most likely reflect real user intents.  Mfano wetu unapata ufanisi mkubwa katika bendera mbili za uchimbaji wa sekondari (Shule, Geo) yenye taarifa zisizo sahihi.', 'tr': 'Semantik tansçylar tebigy dil sözlerini möhüm namaýyşlara g örkez (meselâ, programler). Bärde nusgalar adatça gerekli täsirli duýdurma çabalarynyň sebäbi okuwçylygyň azalygyna görýärler. Ýakynda öwrenmeler, kanonik sözlerin we programleriň örneklerini gramatik dilinden çykarmak üçin 0-at öwrenmesini başarmady we bu sözlerini çykarmady. Ýöne ýaly syntetik mysallar hakyky maglumatlarda nusgalary doly çekip bilmeýär. Bu kagyzda biz nul atly çykyşçylary dili we logik gapylaryň lenslerini (Herzig we Berant, 2019) çykyşyň, kanonik örnekleri we dünýä ullanýän işleýän çykyşlyklaryň arasynda çykyşlygyny çözýäris. Biz bu boşluklary gelişmiş grammalar, güýçli parafrazler we kanonik örneklerini ulanyp täsirli öwrenmek taryşlaryny teklip edip görýäris. Bizim modelimiz iki semantik çözümleme benchmarkları (Scholar, Geo) üzerinde güçlü etkinlik ulaşıyor.', 'af': "Semantiese verwerkers kaap natuurlike taal uitspraak in betekenis voorstellings (bv. programme). Hierdie modele is tipies opgebreek deur die ongelukkigheid van onderwerp data vanweë die benodig arbeidlike annotasie versoeke. Onlangse studie het nul-skoot leer uitgevoer deur te sintetiseer voorbeelde van kanoniese uitspraak en programme van 'n grammatiek, en verdere parafrasiering van hierdie uitspraak om lingwisiese diversiteit te verbeter. Maar sodanige sintetiese voorbeelde kan nie volledig patrone in regte data opneem nie. In hierdie papier analyseer ons nul-skoot verwerkers deur die lense van die taal en logiese spasies (Herzig en Berant, 2019), wat die verskilligheid van taal en programmatike patrone tussen die kanoniese voorbeelde en reël-wêreld gebruiker uitgevoer het. Ons stel voorstel om hierdie gapte te brui deur die gebruik van verbeterde gramme, sterker parafrasers en effektief leermeetode te gebruik met kanoniese voorbeelde wat mees waarskynlik regte gebruikerintekens reflekteer. Ons model bereik sterk prestasie op twee semantiese verwerking benchmarke (Scholar, Geo) met nul gemerkte data.", 'sq': "Analizatorët Semantikë hartojnë shprehjet e gjuhës natyrore në përfaqësime të kuptueshme (për shembull, programe). Modelet e tilla zakonisht janë të bllokuara nga mungesa e të dhënave të trajnimit për shkak të përpjekjeve të kërkuara të vështirë të anotacionit. Studimet e fundit kanë kryer mësim zero-shot duke sintetizuar shembuj trajnimi të shprehjeve dhe programeve kanonike nga një gramatikë dhe parafrazimin e mëtejshëm të këtyre shprehjeve për të përmirësuar diversitetin gjuhësor. Megjithatë, shembuj të tillë sintetikë nuk mund të kapin plotësisht modele në të dhënat reale. Në këtë letër ne analizojmë analizuesit zero-shot nëpërmjet lenteve të gjuhës dhe boshllëqet logjike (Herzig dhe Berant, 2019), të cilat kuantifikojnë mospërputhjen e gjuhës dhe modeleve programatike midis shembujve kanonike dhe ato të botës reale të përdoruesve. Ne propozojmë t'i mbulojmë këto mungesa duke përdorur gramatikat e përmirësuara, parafrazionet më të forta dhe metodat e mësimit të efektshme duke përdorur shembuj kanonikë që me shumë gjasa pasqyrojnë qëllimet e vërtetë të përdoruesve. Our model achieves strong performance on two semantic parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) with zero labeled data.", 'am': 'የስሜናክኛ ፓርላር የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋዎች ቃላትን ማህበረሰብ (ለምሳሌ ፕሮግራሞች) እንደዚህ ዓይነቶች በተፈለገው የድካም አካባቢ ድጋፍ ምክንያት በማስተማር ዳራዎችን በመጠቀም ይታወካሉ፡፡ የአሁኑ ትምህርት በቋንቋ ልዩነትን ለማሻሻል የካኖኒካዊ ቃላት እና ፕሮግራም ምሳሌዎችን በመሰብሰብ በጽሑፍ ተማርተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን እንደዚህ ያሉት ምሳሌዎች እውነተኛ ዳታዎች ምሳሌዎችን በሙሉ ሊይዙ አይችሉም። በዚህ ፕሮግራም የቋንቋ እና የሎጂ መለያየት ቋንቋ እና በሪንት (ሄርዚግ እና ቤርና 2019)፣ የቋንቋ እና የፕሮግራማዊ ምሳሌዎች እና እውነተኛ ዓለማዊ ተጠቃሚዎች እና የቋንቋ እና የፕሮግራሙት ዓይነቶችን በማስተካከል እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ We propose bridging these gaps using improved grammars, stronger paraphrasers, and efficient learning methods using canonical examples that most likely reflect real user intents.  ሞዴሌያችን በሁለት የsemantic parsing benchmarks (Schoolr, Geo) በ0 የጽሑፍ ዳታዎች ላይ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ վերլուծումները քարտեզագրում են բնական լեզվի արտահայտությունները իմաստային ներկայացումների (օրինակ ծրագրեր) մեջ: Այսպիսի մոդելները սովորաբար խեղճված են ուսուցման տվյալների բացակայության պատճառով, որոնց պատճառով անհրաժեշտ աշխատանքային նշումներ են կատարում: Վերջերս ուսումնասիրությունները զրոյական ուսումնասիրություն են կատարել, սինթեզելով գրամատիկայից կանոնիկ արտահայտությունների և ծրագրերի ուսումնասիրության օրինակներ, և ապագայում պարաֆրեզելով այս արտահայտությունները լեզվաբանական բազմազանության բարելավ Այնուամենայնիվ, այսպիսի սինթետիկ օրինակներ չեն կարող ամբողջովին վերցնել իրական տվյալներում գտնվող կաղապարները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք վերլուծում ենք զրոյական նկարներ լեզվի և տրամաբանական տարբերությունների ոսպնյակների միջոցով (Հերցիգ և Բերանթ, 2019 թվականը), որոնք չափեցնում են լեզվի և ծրագրային կաղապարների տարբերությունը կանոնիկ օրինակների և իրական աշխարհի օգտագործողների միջև: Մենք առաջարկում ենք այս տարբերությունները հաղթահարել օգտագործելով բարելավված գրաֆրեզներ, ավելի ուժեղ պարաֆրեզներ և արդյունավետ ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ՝ օգտագործելով կանոնական օրինակներ, որոնք հավանաբար արտացոլում են իրական Our model achieves strong performance on two semantic parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) with zero labeled data.', 'az': 'Semantik ayırıcılar təbiətli dil sözlərini məlumatı olaraq (məsələn, proqramlar). Bütün modellər çox çətinlikli məlumatların təhsil edilməsi üzündən təhsil edilməsinin zəifliyi təhsil edir. Son proqrammalardan canonik sözlərin və proqramların məsəllərini sintezləşdirmək üçün sıfır fəst öyrənməsi təhsil etdi və bu sözləri dil müxtəlifliyini daha da artırmaq üçün parafraza saldılar. Ancaq bu sintetik nümunələr həqiqət məlumatlarda örtükləri tamamlayamaz. Bu kağızda biz sıfır fərqli parçacıları dil və lojik boşluqların (Herzig və Berant, 2019), kanonik məsəllərin və real-dünya istifadəçilərin arasındakı dil və proqrammatik modellərin müxtəlifliyini hesablayırıq. Biz bu boşluqları daha yaxşılaşdırmağı, daha qüvvətli parafrazləri və canonik məsəllərini istifadə edən canonik məsəlləri ilə birləşdirməyi təklif edirik. Modelimiz sıfır etiketlənmiş verilər ilə iki semantik ayırma benchmarklarında qüvvətli performansını başarır.', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক পার্সারের মানে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ভাষার কথা মানচিত্র (উদাহরণস্বরূপ প প্রোগ্রাম)। এই ধরনের মডেলগুলো সাধারণত প্রশিক্ষণের প্রয়োজনীয় শ্রমিক বিষয়ক প্রচেষ্টার কারণে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যের প্রতি  সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা শুরু করেছে গ্রামার থেকে ক্যানোনিক ভাষা এবং প্রোগ্রামের প্রশিক্ষণের উদাহরণের মাধ্যমে ক্যানোনিক ভাষার প্রশিক্ষণের উদাহরণ এবং  তবে এই ধরনের সিন্টিটিক উদাহরণ বাস্তব তথ্যে পুরোপুরি প্যাটারেন্ট গ্রহণ করতে পারে না। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভাষা এবং লজিক্যাল বিভ্রান্ত ভাষার মাধ্যমে শূন্য-গুলি পার্সার বিশ্লেষণ করি (হার্জিগ এবং বার্যান্ট, ২০১৯), যা ক্যানোনিক্যাল উদাহরণ এবং বাস্তবত ক্যানোনিক্যাল উদাহরণ ব্যবহার করে উন্নত গ্রাম, শক্তিশালী প্যারাফ্রাফার এবং কার্যকর শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে এই বিভ্রান্তিগুলো আমাদের মডেল দুই সেমেন্টিক পার্কিং পার্কিং বেনমার্ক (স্কোলার, গিও) নিয়ে শক্তিশালী প্রদর্শনের কাজ অর্জন করেছে যার', 'bs': 'Semantički parseri mapiraju prirodne govore jezika u značajne predstave (npr. programe). Takvi modeli su obično oštećeni nedostatkom podataka obuke zbog potrebnih napora radnih annotacija. Nedavno ispitivanje provelo je učenje od nule šanse sintezirajući primjere obuke kaničkih govora i programa iz gramatike i dalje parafrazirajući te govore kako bi poboljšala jezičku raznolikost. Međutim, takvi sintetički primjeri ne mogu potpuno uhvatiti obrasce u pravim podacima. U ovom papiru analiziramo praznike nule pucnjave kroz lense jezika i logičkih praznina (Herzig i Berant, 2019), koji kvantificiraju diskreciju jezika i programskih obrazaca između kanoničkih primjera i izvođenih korisnika na stvarnom svijetu. Predlažemo prebaciti te praznine koristeći poboljšane gramare, jače parafraze i efikasne metode učenja koristeći kanoničke primjere koje najvjerojatnije odražavaju prave namjere korisnika. Naš model postiže jaku učinku na dvije semantičke kriterije analize (škola, Geo) sa nulom označenim podacima.', 'ca': "Els analitzadors semàtics mapeixen les expressions de llenguatge natural en representacions significatives (per exemple, programes). Normalment, aquests models es bloquejen per la escassetat de dades d'entrenament a causa dels esforços laboriosos requerits d'anotació. Els estudis recents han fet aprenentatge de fotografies zero sintetitzant exemples d'entrenament de frases canòniques i programes d'una gramàtica, i parafraseant més aquestes frases per millorar la diversitat lingüística. Tanmateix, aquests exemples sintètics no poden capturar plenament patrons en dades reals. En aquest paper analitzem els analitzadors de fotografies zero a través de les lentils de les diferències lingüístices i lògices (Herzig i Berant, 2019), que quantifiquen la discrepancia entre els patrons lingüístics i programàtics entre els exemples canònics i els publicats per l'usuari del món real. Proposem superar aquestes diferències fent servir gramàtiques millorades, parafrases més fortes i mètodes d'aprenentatge eficients fent servir exemples canònics que probablement reflecteixen les intencions reals dels usuaris. El nostre model aconsegueix un fort rendiment en dos punts de referència semàntics d'analització (Scholar, Geo) amb dades etiquetades zero.", 'cs': 'Sémantické parsery mapují výroky přirozeného jazyka do reprezentací významů (např. programy). Tyto modely jsou obvykle omezeny nedostatkem tréninkových dat kvůli požadovanému námahnému anotaci. Nedávné studie prováděly nulové učení syntetizováním výcvikových příkladů kanonických výroků a programů z gramatiky a dalším parafrázováním těchto výroků za účelem zlepšení jazykové rozmanitosti. Takové syntetické příklady však nemohou plně zachytit vzorce v reálných datech. V tomto článku analyzujeme nulové parsery pomocí objektivů jazykových a logických mezer (Herzig a Berant, 2019), které kvantifikují rozpor jazyka a programatických vzorců mezi kanonickými příklady a skutečnými uživateli vydanými. Navrhujeme překlenout tyto mezery pomocí vylepšených gramatik, silnějších parafrázérů a efektivních metod učení s využitím kanonických příkladů, které s největší pravděpodobností odrážejí reálné záměry uživatelů. Náš model dosahuje vysokého výkonu na dvou sémantických analýzovacích benchmarkech (Scholar, Geo) s nulovými označenými daty.', 'fi': 'Semanttiset jäsentäjät kartoittavat luonnollisen kielen ilmaisut merkityksen esittämiseksi (esim. ohjelmiksi). Tällaiset mallit ovat tyypillisesti pullonkauloja koulutusdatan niukkuus vaativan vaivalloisen merkinnän vuoksi. Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat suorittaneet nolla-shot-oppimista syntetisoimalla koulutusesimerkkejä kanonisista ilmaisuista ja ohjelmista kieliopista ja vertaamalla näitä ilmaisuja edelleen kielellisen monimuotoisuuden parantamiseksi. Tällaiset synteettiset esimerkit eivät kuitenkaan pysty täysin kuvaamaan kuvioita todellisessa datassa. Tässä työssä analysoimme nollahaun parsereita kielen linssien ja loogisten aukkojen avulla (Herzig ja Berant, 2019), jotka kvantifioivat kieli- ja ohjelmointimallien eroavaisuuksia kanonisten ja todellisten käyttäjien antamien esimerkkien välillä. Ehdotamme näiden aukkojen korjaamista käyttämällä parannettuja kieliopioita, vahvempia sanamuotoja ja tehokkaita oppimismenetelmiä käyttäen kanonisia esimerkkejä, jotka todennäköisesti heijastavat todellisia käyttäjien aikomuksia. Mallimme saavuttaa vahvan suorituskyvyn kahdella semanttisella parsauksen vertailuarvolla (Scholar, Geo) nollamerkityllä datalla.', 'et': 'Semantilised parserid kaardistavad looduskeelseid väljendeid tähendusekujutusteks (nt programmideks). Selliseid mudeleid takistab tavaliselt koolitusandmete vähesus nõutavate vaevaliste märgistamisjõupingutuste tõttu. Hiljutised uuringud on läbi viinud null-shot õppimise, sünteesides koolitusnäiteid kanooniliste väljendite ja programmide grammatikast ning parandades neid väljendeid keelelise mitmekesisuse parandamiseks. Sellised sünteetilised näited ei suuda aga täielikult jäädvustada mustreid reaalsetes andmetes. Käesolevas töös analüüsime null-shot parsereid keele läätsede ja loogiliste lünkade kaudu (Herzig ja Berant, 2019), mis kvantifitseerivad keele- ja programmeerimismustrite erinevust kanooniliste ja reaalsete kasutajate väljastatud näidete vahel. Me teeme ettepaneku nende lünkade ületamiseks kasutades täiustatud grammatikaid, tugevamaid parafrasereid ja tõhusaid õppemeetodeid, kasutades kanoonilisi näiteid, mis tõenäoliselt kajastavad tegelikke kasutajate kavatsusi. Meie mudel saavutab tugeva jõudluse kahel semantilisel parsimise võrdlusalusel (Scholar, Geo) nulli märgistatud andmetega.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Waccan misãlai ko da kawaici, za'a buɗe su da rabon data na ƙidãya sabo da aikin da aka buƙata. Tauraren nan da suka sami karatun na sifara da yin amfani da tsarin masu kula da shiryoyin ayuka na kanonical da shiryoyin ayuka daga grammar, kuma ya sami furofarin wannan magana dõmin ya kyautata mulki-linguin. A lokacin da, misãlai wannan na haɗi ba za'a iya samun su sami tsari cikin data na gaske ba. Daga wannan takardan, Munã anayya parser masu yin sifanci a tsakanin linja na harshen da gaura na logiki (Herzig da Bernt, 2019), wanda ke ƙayyade tsakanin harshe da shiryoyin ayuka da masu shirya tsakanin misãlai da masu amfani da masu cikin duniya masu gaske. Kayyari ne Muke samar da su sami wannan gaura da za'a yi amfani da shiryoyin grammati, masu ƙaranci, da shiryoyin ayuka masu amfani da misãlai masu kanonical da ke iya ƙayyade masu yiwuwa. Misalinmu ya sãmu mai ƙarfi a kan parse biyu na semantic (Scholar, Geo) da data ba'a rubutu ba.", 'sk': 'Semantni razčlenjevalci kartirajo izraze naravnega jezika v pomenske reprezentacije (npr. programe). Takšne modele običajno ovira pomanjkanje podatkov o usposabljanju zaradi zahtevanih napornih prizadevanj za ozka grla. Nedavne študije so izvedle ničelno učenje s sintetizacijo primerov usposabljanja kanoničnih izgovorov in programov iz slovnice ter nadaljnjim parafraziranjem teh izgovorov za izboljšanje jezikovne raznolikosti. Vendar takšni sintetični primeri ne morejo v celoti zajeti vzorcev v realnih podatkih. V prispevku analiziramo analizo ničelnih razčlenjevalnikov skozi objektive jezikovnih in logičnih vrzeli (Herzig in Berant, 2019), ki kvantificirajo razliko med jezikovnimi in programskimi vzorci med kanoničnimi primeri in tistimi, ki jih izdajajo uporabniki v realnem svetu. Predlagamo premostitev teh vrzeli z izboljšanimi slovničnimi besedami, močnejšimi parafraserji in učinkovitimi metodami učenja z uporabo kanoničnih primerov, ki najverjetneje odražajo resnične namere uporabnikov. Naš model dosega močno učinkovitost pri dveh semantičnih referenčnih vrednostih razčlenjanja (Scholar, Geo) z nič označenimi podatki.', 'jv': 'Samanti Rasané padha biasane ngududu akeh pisan neng dadi luwih nggawe gerakan kaya ngono nggawe dolanan sing ngomong sapa ngono kuwi tindakan. Cah-cah sing paling nggambar uwong saiki nggambar 0-uwong Nanging, sampeyan siwek-sampeyan ora iso ngubah akeh perusahaan ning data Quit Nang pepulan iki kita diwatilih pernik (0-shot) pernik dipunalki nggambar luwih lan kelas ngregani soko ngregani soko nggambar nggagal (Hersig lan Berant, 2011), sing nyimpen kuwi nggawe gerakan luwih akeh lan kelas kuwi nggawe gerarangka sakjane usul kanggo Ketokani lan akeh bener-uwong. Awak dhéwé nggawe geranggap iki nggawe luwih nggawe geranggap, dadi kaparan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe Monday', 'he': 'מעבדות סמנטיות מפות מילים שפה טבעית לתוך מייצגים משמעותיים (למשל תוכניות). דוגמנים כאלה נדבקים בדרך כלל על ידי חסר מידע האימונים בגלל מאמצי הערות העובדים הנדרשים. מחקרים לאחרונה ביצעו לימוד אפס-יריות על ידי סינטזיה דוגמאות אימונים של מילים קנוניקים ותוכניות מתוך גרמטיקה, ולהפרמיטזיה נוספת של מילים אלה כדי לשפר את מגוון השפתיים. עם זאת, דוגמאות סינטטיות כאלה לא יכולות לתפוס דפוסים במלוא במידע אמיתי. בעיתון הזה אנו מנתחים מעבדות אפס-צילומים דרך העדשות של השפה והפערים הגיוניים (Herzig וברנט, 2019), שמכירים את ההבדל של שפה ובדפוסים תוכניים בין דוגמאות קנוניות ובדפוסים משתמשים בעולם האמיתי. אנחנו מציעים לשבור את הפערים האלה באמצעות גרמטיקות משתפרות, פרייזרים חזקים יותר, ושיטות לימוד יעילות באמצעות דוגמאות קנוניות שכנראה משקפים כוונות משתמשים אמיתיות. המודל שלנו משיג ביצועים חזקים על שני נקודות מבחן סמנטיים (Scholar, Geo) עם אפס נתונים מסוימים.', 'bo': 'Semantic parsers map natural language utterances into meaning representations (e.g. programs). དབྱེ་རིགས་འདི་དག་གི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་དབུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟར་ཉམས་འཇོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད་པར། འཕྲལ་གསོག་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་ཚིག་གིས་སྐད་རིགས་སྨྱུག་ལས་བློ་གཏོང་གི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་ལས་ཕར་མེད་བསླབ་སྐྱེན་ཐབས་རྩོལ་བ་མ་ཤ ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་དག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་རྟོགས་མི་ཐུབ་པ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ནུས་ཀྱི་བར་སྟོང་བཅད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དང་བརྗོད་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དང་། We propose bridging these gaps using improved grammars, stronger paraphrasers, and efficient learning methods using canonical examples that most likely reflect real user intents. Our model achieves strong performance on two semantic parsing benchmarks (Scholar, Geo) with zero labeled data.'}
{'en': 'Guided Attention Multimodal Multitask Financial Forecasting with Inter-Company Relationships and Global and Local News', 'ar': 'تخفيف التحيز في تقدير جودة الترجمة الآلية', 'fr': "Atténuation des biais dans l'estimation de la qualité", 'pt': 'Mitigação de viés na estimativa de qualidade da tradução automática', 'es': 'Mitigación de sesgos en la estimación de calidad', 'ja': '機械翻訳品質見積もりにおけるバイアス緩和', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद गुणवत्ता अनुमान में पूर्वाग्रह शमन', 'zh': '机器翻译质估中偏差缓解', 'ru': 'Смягчение смещения при оценке качества машинного перевода', 'ga': 'Maolú Laofachta i Meastachán Cáilíochta Aistriúcháin Meaisín', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μείωση της προκατάληψης στην εκτίμηση της ποιότητας της μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'hu': 'Bias enyhítése a gépi fordítás minőségbecslésében', 'it': 'Mitigazione del bias nella stima della qualità della traduzione automatica', 'lt': 'Mašin ų vertimo kokybės vertinimo kliūčių mažinimas', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аудару сапасының шегіндіру', 'mk': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'ms': 'Penurangan Bias dalam Estimasi Kualiti Terjemahan Mesin', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ എസ്റ്റിമേഷനിലെ ബിയാസ് മീറ്റിഗേഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mitfija tal-ħsara fl-istima tal-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni tal-makkinarju', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө оруулах чадварын тооцоолол биas Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'pl': 'Łagodzenie uprzedzeń w ocenie jakości tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'no': 'Bias Mitigatsjon i anslag av maskineomsetjingskvaliteten', 'ro': 'Atenuarea bias în estimarea calității traducerii automate', 'sr': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'so': 'Bias Mitigation in machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'si': 'මැෂින් වාර්ථාව කුළුවත් අනුමාණයේ බියාස් මිටිගේටන්ස්', 'ta': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'sv': 'Bias Mitigation i kvalitetsberäkning av maskinöversättning', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ کیلوٹی کا ارزش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đối chiếu kỹ thuật trong lớp Cơ khí dịch ước lượng chất lượng', 'nl': 'Bias mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'da': 'Bias Mitigation i maskinoversættelseskvalitetsestimering', 'bg': 'Намаляване на наклоненията в оценката на качеството на машинния превод', 'hr': 'Procjena kvalitete prevoda strojeva', 'de': 'Bias Minderung bei der Qualitätsschätzung maschineller Übersetzung', 'id': 'Penolakan Bias dalam Perkiraan Kualitas Terjemahan Mesin', 'ko': '품질 평가에서의 편차 완화', 'fa': 'تعادل بیس در ارزیابی کیفیت ترجمه ماشین', 'sw': 'Mitigation in Translation Quality Estimation', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjime Quality Taýýarlamasynda Iýtgetme', 'af': 'Bias Mitigation in Masjien Vertaling Kwaliteit Estimasie', 'sq': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'hy': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'am': 'መሀከል', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের মান গণনা', 'bs': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'ca': 'Mitigation of Bias in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'cs': 'Zmírnění předsudků v odhadu kvality strojového překladu', 'az': 'Makinat √áeviri N…ôviyy…ôtind…ô Bias Mitigation (Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation)', 'et': 'Eelarvamuste leevendamine masintõlke kvaliteedi hindamisel', 'fi': 'Bias Mitigation in Machine Translation Quality Estimation', 'sk': 'Blažitev pristranskosti pri oceni kakovosti strojnega prevoda', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Bias mitigation kanggo Kemerdekaan Pakan Terjamahan', 'he': 'להקל ביאס בערכת איכות התרגום של מכונות', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་ལུགས་དབྱིབས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་པ'}
{'en': 'Most works on financial forecasting use information directly associated with individual companies (e.g., stock prices, news on the company) to predict stock returns for trading. We refer to such company-specific information as local information. Stock returns may also be influenced by global information (e.g., news on the economy in general), and inter-company relationships. Capturing such diverse information is challenging due to the low signal-to-noise ratios, different time-scales, sparsity and distributions of global and local information from different modalities. In this paper, we propose a model that captures both global and local multimodal information for investment and risk management-related forecasting tasks. Our proposed Guided Attention Multimodal Multitask Network (GAME) model addresses these challenges by using novel attention modules to guide learning with global and local information from different modalities and dynamic inter-company relationship networks. Our extensive experiments show that GAME outperforms other state-of-the-art models in several forecasting tasks and important real-world application case studies.', 'ar': 'يهدف تقدير جودة الترجمة الآلية (QE) إلى بناء نماذج تنبؤية لتقييم جودة الترجمات المنشأة آليًا في غياب الترجمات المرجعية. بينما تم إثبات أن نماذج التيسير الكمي الحديثة تحقق نتائج جيدة ، فإنها تعتمد بشكل مفرط على الميزات التي ليس لها تأثير سببي على جودة الترجمة. على وجه الخصوص ، يبدو أن هناك تحيزًا جزئيًا للمدخلات ، أي ميل إلى تخصيص درجات عالية الجودة للترجمات التي تتسم بطلاقة وصحيحة نحويًا ، على الرغم من أنها لا تحافظ على معنى المصدر. نقوم بتحليل التحيز الجزئي للمدخلات بمزيد من التفصيل وتقييم أربعة مناهج لاستخدام المهام المساعدة لتخفيف التحيز. تستخدم طريقتان بيانات إضافية لإبلاغ المهمة الرئيسية ودعمها ، بينما الأسلوبان الآخران متعارضان ، مما يثني النموذج عن تعلم التحيز. نحن نقارن الطرق فيما يتعلق بقدرتها على تقليل التحيز الجزئي للمدخلات مع الحفاظ على الأداء العام. وجدنا أن التدريب على بنية متعددة المهام مع مهمة تصنيف ثنائية مساعدة تستخدم بيانات إضافية إضافية يحقق أفضل النتائج المرجوة ويعمم جيدًا على لغات مختلفة ومقاييس الجودة.', 'fr': "L'estimation de la qualité de la traduction automatique (QE) vise à créer des modèles prédictifs pour évaluer la qualité des traductions générées automatiquement en l'absence de traductions de référence. S'il a été démontré que les modèles QE de pointe donnent de bons résultats, ils s'appuient trop sur des fonctionnalités qui n'ont pas d'impact causal sur la qualité d'une traduction. En particulier, il semble y avoir un biais d'entrée partiel, c'est-à-dire une tendance à attribuer des notes de haute qualité à des traductions fluides et grammaticalement correctes, même si elles ne préservent pas le sens de la source. Nous analysons le biais d'entrée partiel de manière plus détaillée et évaluons quatre approches pour utiliser des tâches auxiliaires pour atténuer les biais. Deux approches utilisent des données supplémentaires pour informer et soutenir la tâche principale, tandis que les deux autres sont contradictoires, ce qui dissuade activement le modèle d'apprendre le biais. Nous comparons les méthodes en fonction de leur capacité à réduire le biais d'entrée partiel tout en maintenant les performances globales. Nous avons constaté que l'entraînement d'une architecture multitâche avec une tâche de classification binaire auxiliaire qui utilise des données augmentées supplémentaires permet d'obtenir les effets souhaités et de bien généraliser à différents langages et mesures de qualité.", 'pt': 'A estimativa de qualidade de tradução automática (QE) visa construir modelos preditivos para avaliar a qualidade de traduções geradas por máquina na ausência de traduções de referência. Embora os modelos de QE de última geração tenham demonstrado alcançar bons resultados, eles confiam demais em recursos que não têm um impacto causal na qualidade de uma tradução. Em particular, parece haver um viés de entrada parcial, ou seja, uma tendência a atribuir pontuações de alta qualidade a traduções que são fluentes e gramaticalmente corretas, mesmo que não preservem o significado da fonte. Analisamos o viés de entrada parcial com mais detalhes e avaliamos quatro abordagens para usar tarefas auxiliares para mitigação do viés. Duas abordagens usam dados adicionais para informar e apoiar a tarefa principal, enquanto as outras duas são adversas, desencorajando ativamente o modelo de aprender o viés. Comparamos os métodos em relação à sua capacidade de reduzir o viés de entrada parcial, mantendo o desempenho geral. Descobrimos que treinar uma arquitetura multitarefa com uma tarefa de classificação binária auxiliar que utiliza dados aumentados adicionais atinge melhor os efeitos desejados e generaliza bem para diferentes linguagens e métricas de qualidade.', 'es': 'La estimación de la calidad de la traducción automática (QE) tiene como objetivo crear modelos predictivos para evaluar la calidad de las traducciones generadas por máquina en ausencia de traducciones de referencia. Si bien se ha demostrado que los modelos de QE de última generación logran buenos resultados, se basan demasiado en características que no tienen un impacto causal en la calidad de una traducción. En particular, parece haber un sesgo de entrada parcial, es decir, una tendencia a asignar puntuaciones de alta calidad a las traducciones que son fluidas y gramaticalmente correctas, aunque no preserven el significado de la fuente. Analizamos el sesgo de entrada parcial con más detalle y evaluamos cuatro enfoques para usar tareas auxiliares para la mitigación del sesgo. Dos enfoques utilizan datos adicionales para informar y apoyar la tarea principal, mientras que los otros dos son contradictorios, lo que desalienta activamente al modelo de aprender el sesgo. Comparamos los métodos con respecto a su capacidad para reducir el sesgo de entrada parcial mientras se mantiene el rendimiento general. Descubrimos que entrenar una arquitectura multitarea con una tarea de clasificación binaria auxiliar que utiliza datos aumentados adicionales logra mejor los efectos deseados y se generaliza bien a diferentes lenguajes y métricas de calidad.', 'ja': '機械翻訳品質推定（ QE ）は、参照翻訳がない場合に機械生成翻訳の品質を評価するための予測モデルを構築することを目的としています。 最先端のQEモデルは良好な結果を達成することが示されていますが、翻訳の品質に因果関係のない機能に過度に依存しています。 特に、部分的な入力バイアス、すなわち、ソースの意味を保持していないにもかかわらず、流暢で文法的に正しい翻訳に高品質のスコアを割り当てる傾向があるように見える。 部分入力バイアスをさらに詳細に分析し、バイアス軽減のための補助タスクを使用するための4つのアプローチを評価します。 2つのアプローチでは、追加のデータを使用して主なタスクに情報を提供し、サポートしますが、他の2つは対立的であり、モデルがバイアスを学習することを積極的に阻害します。 全体的なパフォーマンスを維持しながら、部分的な入力バイアスを低減する能力に関して、方法を比較します。 追加の拡張データを利用した補助的なバイナリ分類タスクを使用したマルチタスクアーキテクチャのトレーニングは、望ましい効果を最良に達成し、さまざまな言語と品質メトリックにうまく一般化することがわかります。', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद गुणवत्ता आकलन (क्यूई) का उद्देश्य संदर्भ अनुवाद की अनुपस्थिति में मशीन-जनित अनुवादों की गुणवत्ता का आकलन करने के लिए पूर्वानुमानित मॉडल का निर्माण करना है। जबकि अत्याधुनिक क्यूई मॉडल को अच्छे परिणाम प्राप्त करने के लिए दिखाया गया है, वे उन विशेषताओं पर अधिक भरोसा करते हैं जिनका अनुवाद की गुणवत्ता पर कारण प्रभाव नहीं पड़ता है। विशेष रूप से, एक आंशिक इनपुट पूर्वाग्रह प्रतीत होता है, यानी, अनुवादों को उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले स्कोर असाइन करने की प्रवृत्ति जो धाराप्रवाह और व्याकरणिक रूप से सही हैं, भले ही वे स्रोत के अर्थ को संरक्षित न करें। हम आगे विस्तार से आंशिक इनपुट पूर्वाग्रह का विश्लेषण करते हैं और पूर्वाग्रह शमन के लिए सहायक कार्यों का उपयोग करने के लिए चार दृष्टिकोणों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। दो दृष्टिकोण मुख्य कार्य को सूचित करने और समर्थन करने के लिए अतिरिक्त डेटा का उपयोग करते हैं, जबकि अन्य दो प्रतिकूल हैं, सक्रिय रूप से पूर्वाग्रह सीखने से मॉडल को हतोत्साहित करते हैं। हम समग्र प्रदर्शन को बनाए रखते हुए आंशिक इनपुट पूर्वाग्रह को कम करने की उनकी क्षमता के संबंध में विधियों की तुलना करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि एक सहायक बाइनरी वर्गीकरण कार्य के साथ एक मल्टीटास्क आर्किटेक्चर का प्रशिक्षण जो अतिरिक्त संवर्धित डेटा का सबसे अच्छा उपयोग करता है, वांछित प्रभाव प्राप्त करता है और विभिन्न भाषाओं और गुणवत्ता मीट्रिक के लिए अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत करता है।', 'zh': '机器翻译质评估 (QE) 旨在构测模形,以质于未参译者机器生成其质。 虽先进量化宽模已验可得,然过恃译者无因果之功。 特是,似有偏差,即向分高质量流利而语法正译,即无保留来源之义。 臣等更详细分析偏差,并评以佐务解偏差四法。 二术用额外之数以通大务,而二者为对抗性,极沮模学之偏劣。 我们较了这种方法在保持全体性能的同时减输偏差。 臣谨按:佐二元分类训练多任务架构(额外增数)可以上成效,善推言质量指标。', 'ru': 'Оценка качества машинного перевода (QE) направлена на построение прогностических моделей для оценки качества машинных переводов в отсутствие эталонных переводов. Хотя было показано, что современные модели QE достигают хороших результатов, они чрезмерно полагаются на функции, которые не оказывают причинно-следственного влияния на качество перевода. В частности, представляется, что существует частичная погрешность ввода, т.е. тенденция к присвоению высококачественных баллов переводам, которые свободно и грамматически правильны, даже несмотря на то, что они не сохраняют значения источника. Мы более подробно анализируем частичное смещение входных данных и оцениваем четыре подхода к использованию вспомогательных задач для смягчения смещения. Два подхода используют дополнительные данные для информирования и поддержки основной задачи, в то время как два других подхода являются соперническими, активно отталкивая модель от изучения предвзятости. Мы сравниваем методы с точки зрения их способности уменьшить частичное смещение ввода при сохранении общей производительности. Мы обнаружили, что обучение многозадачной архитектуры со вспомогательной задачей бинарной классификации, которая использует дополнительные дополненные данные, наилучшим образом достигает желаемых эффектов и хорошо обобщает различные языки и метрики качества.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag Meastachán Cáilíochta an Aistriúcháin Inneall (QE) samhlacha réamh-mheastacháin a thógáil chun cáilíocht na n-aistriúchán meaisín-ghinte a mheas in éagmais aistriúcháin tagartha. Cé gur léiríodh go bhfuil torthaí maithe á mbaint amach ag samhlacha QE úrscothacha, bíonn siad ag brath an iomarca ar ghnéithe nach mbíonn tionchar cúiseach acu ar cháilíocht an aistriúcháin. Go háirithe, is cosúil go bhfuil claonadh ionchuir páirteach ann, i.e., claonadh scóir ardcháilíochta a shannadh d’aistriúcháin atá líofa agus ceart ó thaobh gramadaí de, cé nach gcaomhnaíonn siad brí na foinse. Déanaimid anailís níos mine ar chlaonadh an ionchuir pháirtigh agus déanaimid meastóireacht ar cheithre chur chuige chun tascanna cúnta a úsáid le haghaidh maolú ar an gclaonadh. Úsáideann dhá chur chuige sonraí breise chun an príomhthasc a threorú agus chun tacú leis, agus tá an dá chur chuige eile sáraíochta, rud a dhíspreagann an tsamhail go gníomhach ó bheith ag foghlaim na claonta. Déanaimid comparáid idir na modhanna maidir lena gcumas an claonadh ionchuir páirteach a laghdú agus an fheidhmíocht iomlán á coinneáil ag an am céanna. Feicimid gurb é an oiliúint is fearr ar ailtireacht iltasc le tasc cúnta aicmithe dhénártha a úsáideann sonraí méadaithe breise na héifeachtaí inmhianaithe a bhaint amach agus a ghinearálú go maith do theangacha éagsúla agus do mhéadracht cháilíochta.', 'el': 'Η εκτίμηση ποιότητας μηχανικής μετάφρασης (QE) αποσκοπεί στη δημιουργία προβλέψιμων μοντέλων για την αξιολόγηση της ποιότητας των μεταφράσεων που παράγονται από μηχανές ελλείψει μεταφράσεων αναφοράς. Ενώ τα σύγχρονα μοντέλα QE έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι επιτυγχάνουν καλά αποτελέσματα, βασίζονται υπερβολικά σε χαρακτηριστικά που δεν έχουν αιτιολογικό αντίκτυπο στην ποιότητα μιας μετάφρασης. Ειδικότερα, φαίνεται να υπάρχει μερική προκατάληψη εισαγωγής, δηλαδή η τάση να αποδίδονται βαθμολογίες υψηλής ποιότητας σε μεταφράσεις που είναι άπταιστες και γραμματικά ορθές, παρόλο που δεν διατηρούν το νόημα της πηγής. Αναλύουμε λεπτομερέστερα τη μερική προκατάληψη εισόδου και αξιολογούμε τέσσερις προσεγγίσεις για τη χρήση βοηθητικών εργασιών για τον μετριασμό της προκατάλειψης. Δύο προσεγγίσεις χρησιμοποιούν πρόσθετα δεδομένα για να ενημερώσουν και να υποστηρίξουν το κύριο έργο, ενώ οι άλλες δύο είναι αντίθετες, αποθαρρύνοντας ενεργά το μοντέλο από το να μάθει την προκατάληψη. Συγκρίνουμε τις μεθόδους όσον αφορά την ικανότητά τους να μειώσουν τη μερική προκατάληψη εισόδου διατηρώντας παράλληλα τη συνολική απόδοση. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η εκπαίδευση μιας αρχιτεκτονικής πολλαπλών εργασιών με μια βοηθητική εργασία δυαδικής ταξινόμησης που χρησιμοποιεί πρόσθετα ενισχυμένα δεδομένα επιτυγχάνει καλύτερα τα επιθυμητά αποτελέσματα και γενικεύει καλά σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες και ποιοτικές μετρήσεις.', 'hu': 'A Gépi Fordítási Minőségbecslés (QE) célja, hogy prediktív modelleket építsen a gép által generált fordítások minőségének értékelésére referencia fordítások hiányában. Bár a legkorszerűbb QE modellek kimutatták, hogy jó eredményeket érnek el, túlságosan olyan funkciókra támaszkodnak, amelyek nem befolyásolják a fordítás minőségét. Különösen úgy tűnik, hogy van egy részleges bemeneti előírás, azaz egy hajlam, hogy magas minőségű pontszámokat rendeljenek a folyékony és nyelvtanilag helyes fordításokhoz, annak ellenére, hogy nem őrzik meg a forrás jelentését. Részletesebben elemezzük a részleges bemeneti előírásokat, és négy megközelítést értékelünk a kiegészítő feladatok alkalmazására az előírások enyhítésére. Két megközelítés további adatokat használ fel a fő feladat tájékoztatására és támogatására, míg a másik kettő ellentétes, aktívan visszatartva a modellt attól, hogy megtanulja az elfogultságot. Összehasonlítjuk a módszereket azzal a képességgel, hogy csökkentsék a részleges bemeneti előírásokat, miközben fenntartják az általános teljesítményt. Úgy találjuk, hogy egy többfeladatos architektúra képzése kiegészítő bináris osztályozási feladattal, amely kiegészítő kiterjesztett adatokat használ, a legjobban elérheti a kívánt hatásokat, és jól általánosítja a különböző nyelveket és minőségi mutatókat.', 'ka': 'მაქსინური გადატყვების კოლეტის განსაზღვრება (QE) მიზეზიან განსაზღვრებული მოდელების შექმნა მაქსინური გადატყვების კოლეტის განსაზღვრება, როცა რეფერენციის გადატ სანამ QE მოდელების სტატური მოდელები ჩვენებულია, რომლებიც კარგი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობად, ისინი უფრო დარწმუნდება ფუნქციებზე, რომლებიც არ აქვს წარმოდგენელი შე განსაკუთრებულია, როგორც განსაკუთრებულია ფართოლური შეტყობინება, მაგრამ ისინი არ შეუძლიათ წარმოიდგინოთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წ ჩვენ გავაანალიზებთ დამატებით განსაზღვრებით ფართოლური შემოწყობინება და გავაკეთებთ ოთხი შემოწყობინება, რომ გამოყენებთ დახმარებელი საქმედების მიმატებისთვის. ორი დახმარება გამოყენება დამატებული მონაცემების ინფორმაციისთვის და მხარდაჭერისთვის, მაგრამ მეორე ორი განსაკუთრებულია, აკრთვიურად მოდელის გასწავლებისთვის გადაუწ ჩვენ მეტირების შესახებ მათი შესაძლებლობის გადასრულებას გადასრულებას გადასრულებას გადასრულებას. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ მრავალრამეტური აქტიქტიქტურის განაკეთება, რომელიც გამოიყენებს დამატებული აქტიქტურებული მონაცემები, უფრო უფრო მსგავსიერებული ეფექტურების და გენერალიზებ', 'it': "La stima della qualità della traduzione automatica (QE) mira a costruire modelli predittivi per valutare la qualità delle traduzioni generate dalla macchina in assenza di traduzioni di riferimento. Anche se è stato dimostrato che i modelli QE all'avanguardia raggiungono buoni risultati, si basano eccessivamente su funzionalità che non hanno un impatto causale sulla qualità di una traduzione. In particolare, sembra esserci una parziale polarizzazione degli input, cioè una tendenza ad assegnare punteggi di alta qualità a traduzioni che sono fluenti e grammaticalmente corrette, anche se non conservano il significato della fonte. Analizziamo il bias parziale degli input in modo più dettagliato e valutiamo quattro approcci per utilizzare attività ausiliarie per mitigare il bias. Due approcci utilizzano dati aggiuntivi per informare e sostenere il compito principale, mentre gli altri due sono contraddittori, scoraggiando attivamente il modello dall'apprendere il bias. Confrontiamo i metodi per quanto riguarda la loro capacità di ridurre il bias parziale di input mantenendo al contempo le prestazioni complessive. Scopriamo che la formazione di un'architettura multitask con un'attività di classificazione binaria ausiliaria che utilizza dati aggiuntivi incrementati raggiunge al meglio gli effetti desiderati e si generalizza bene a diversi linguaggi e metriche di qualità.", 'lt': 'Mašin ų vertimo kokybės vertinimo tikslas – sukurti prognozuojamus vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo kokybės vertinimo modelius, jei vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vertimo vert Nors įrodyta, kad naujausi QE modeliai turi gerų rezultatų, jie pernelyg daug remiasi savybėmis, neturinčiomis priežastinio poveikio vertimo kokybei. Visų pirma atrodo, kad yra dalinis įvedimo nuokrypis, t. y. tendencija skirti aukštos kokybės taškus fluktuojantiems ir gramatiškai tiksliems vertimams, nors jie nepalieka šaltinio reikšmės. Išsamiau išanalizuojame dalinę įnašų pusiausvyrą ir vertiname keturis metodus, kaip naudoti papildomas užduotis pusiausvyros mažinimui. Dviejuose metoduose naudojami papildomi duomenys pagrindiniam uždaviniui informuoti ir paremti, o kiti du yra prieštaringi, aktyviai atgrasant nuo modelio išsiaiškinimo. Palyginame metodus, susijusius su jų gebėjimu sumažinti dalinį įnašo sklaidą ir kartu išlaikyti bendrą veiksmingumą. We find that training a multitask architecture with an auxiliary binary classification task that utilises additional augmented data best achieves the desired effects and generalises well to different languages and quality metrics.', 'mk': 'Проценката на квалитетот на машинските преводи (QE) има за цел да изгради предвидливи модели за проценка на квалитетот на машинските преводи во отсуство на референциски преводи. Иако се покажа дека најдобрите модели на ЦЕ постигнуваат добри резултати, тие се надвор од карактеристики кои немаат причинско влијание врз квалитетот на превод. Посебно, се чини дека постои делумна предрасуда за внесување, т.е. тенденција да се додели висококвалитетни оценки на преводи кои се течни и граматички коректни, иако тие не го зачуваат значењето на изворот. Ние го анализираме делумното вложување предрасуди во понатамошни детали и проценуваме четири пристапи за користење помошни задачи за намалување предрасуди. Двајца пристапи користат дополнителни податоци за информирање и поддршка на главната задача, додека другите двајца се противници, активно го отповикувајќи моделот од учењето на предрасудата. Ги споредуваме методите во однос на нивната способност да ја намалат делумната вложувачка пристрасност и да ја одржуваме целокупната резултатност. Најдовме дека обуката на мултизадачна архитектура со помошна бинарна класификациска задача која користи дополнителни зголемени податоци најдобро ги постигнува желбите ефекти и ги генерализира добро на различни јазици и квалитетни метрики.', 'ms': 'Perkiraan Kualiti Terjemahan Mesin (QE) bertujuan untuk membina model ramalan untuk menilai kualiti terjemahan yang dijana oleh mesin jika tidak ada terjemahan rujukan. Sementara model QE terbaru telah dipaparkan untuk mencapai keputusan yang baik, mereka bergantung terlalu banyak pada ciri-ciri yang tidak mempunyai kesan penyebab pada kualiti terjemahan. Terutama, nampaknya terdapat bias input sebahagian, iaitu cenderung untuk menyerahkan skor kualiti tinggi kepada terjemahan yang fluent dan grammatikal betul, walaupun i a tidak menyimpan makna sumber. We analyse the partial input bias in further detail and evaluate four approaches to use auxiliary tasks for bias mitigation.  Two approaches use additional data to inform and support the main task, while the other two are adversarial, actively discouraging the model from learning the bias.  Kami membandingkan kaedah terhadap kemampuan mereka untuk mengurangi bias input sebahagian sementara menjaga prestasi umum. Kami mendapati bahawa latihan arkitektur berbilang tugas dengan tugas kelasukan binari bantuan yang menggunakan data tambahan ditambah yang terbaik mencapai kesan yang diinginkan dan menyebarkan dengan baik kepada bahasa dan metrik kualiti yang berbeza.', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аудару сапасы (QE) бағалау үлгілерін құру үшін машина құрылған аудармалардың сапатын бағалау үшін мәселесі бар. QE моделдері жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізу үшін көрсетіліп тұрғанда, олар аудармалардың сапасына себепті нәтижесі жоқ мүмкіндіктеріне тәуелді. Мысалы, бөлшекті кіріс тәртібі бар, мысалы, көзінің мағынасын сақтамағанда, жылдамдық және грамматикалық түсініктерге сақтау тәртібі бар. Біз бөлшекті енгізіміздің көмекшілігін қолдану үшін көмекшілік тапсырмаларды көмекшілікті көмекшіліктерді қолдану үшін төрт жағдайды анализиру. Екі жағдай қосымша деректерді негізгі тапсырманы туралы хабарлау және қолдау үшін қолданады, басқа екі қарсылық болса, үлгісін қарсылықты оқытудан тыс сақтау үшін. Біз әдістерді жұмыс істеу үшін олардың бөлігін келтіру мүмкіндігімен салыстырамыз. Біз бірнеше тапсырма архитектурасын көмектесетін, қосымша көмектесетін деректерді қолдану үшін қосымша көмектесетін бинарлық классификациялау тапсырмасы қолданатын көмектесетін деректердің ең жақ', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുറിച്ചുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എസ്റ്റിമേഷന്\u200d (ക്യൂയി) പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന ക്യൂയി മോഡലുകള്\u200d നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്ഥിതിയുടെ അവസ്ഥ കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അവയൊക്കെ പരിഭാഷത്തിന്റെ ഗുണപ്രക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, പകുതിയ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ബിയസ് ഉണ്ടെന്ന് തോന്നുന്നു, അതായത് സൂര്യസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നില്ലെങ്കിലും അത്യുന്നതമായ വിഭാഷ നമ്മള്\u200d പാര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്\u200dറെ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും, ബിയാസ് മീറ്റലിക്കുവാന്\u200d നാല് വഴികള്\u200d വിലാസ Two approaches use additional data to inform and support the main task, while the other two are adversarial, actively discouraging the model from learning the bias.  മൊത്തം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അവരുടെ പാര്\u200dട്ടിലുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ബിയസ് കുറവ്  കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ആഗ്രഹിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും ഗുണ', 'mt': 'L-Istima tal-Kwalità tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju (QE) għandha l-għan li tibni mudelli prevedibbli biex tivvaluta l-kwalità tat-traduzzjonijiet iġġenerati mill-makkinarju fin-nuqqas ta’ traduzzjonijiet ta’ referenza. Filwaqt li ntwera li l-mudelli tal-QE l-aktar avvanzati jiksbu riżultati tajbin, huma jiddependu wisq fuq karatteristiċi li ma għandhomx impatt kawżali fuq il-kwalità ta’ traduzzjoni. In particular, there appears to be a partial input bias, i.e., a tendency to assign high-quality scores to translations that are fluent and grammatically correct, even though they do not preserve the meaning of the source.  Aħna tanalizzaw il-preġudizzju parzjali tal-input f’aktar dettall u jivvalutaw erba’ approċċi biex jintużaw kompiti awżiljarji għall-mitigazzjoni tal-preġudizzju. Żewġ approċċi jużaw dejta addizzjonali biex jinfurmaw u jappoġġjaw il-kompitu ewlieni, filwaqt li t-tnejn l-oħra huma avversarji, u b’mod attiv jiskoraġġixxu l-mudell milli jitgħallem il-preġudizzju. Aħna nqabblu l-metodi fir-rigward tal-kapaċità tagħhom li jnaqqsu l-preġudizzju parzjali tal-input filwaqt li nżammu l-prestazzjoni globali. Aħna nsibu li t-taħriġ ta’ arkitettura multikompitu b’kompitu awżiljarju ta’ klassifikazzjoni binarja li juża dejta miżjuda addizzjonali jilħaq l-a ħjar l-effetti mixtieqa u jiġġeneralizza tajjeb għal lingwi u metriċi ta’ kwalità differenti.', 'no': 'Oversett av maskineomsetjingskvaliteten (QE) er mål å bygge foregåande modeller for å vurdere kvaliteten av maskineoppretta omsetjingar ved utrykk av referansomsetjingar. Selv om QE-modeller for kunsten er viste for å oppnå gode resultat, har dei overstyrt på funksjonar som ikkje har grunnleggjande effekt på kvaliteten av oversettelse. Det ser særskilt ut til at det er ein delvis innføringsforstand, dvs. ein tendens til å tilordna høg kvalitetsforstand til omsetjingar som er flukt og grammatisk rett, selv om dei ikkje beholder meningen på kjelden. Vi analyserer den delvis innføringsforskyvinga i meir detaljar og evaluerer fire tilnærmingar for å bruka hjelpeoppgåver for å redusera bias. To tilnærmingar brukar ekstra data for å informera og støtta hovudoppgåva, mens dei andre to er negativ, og aktivt avbrytar modellen frå læring av forsiktigheten. Vi samanliknar metodane med hensyn til at dei kan redusere den delvis inndata-forholdet mens det gjeld heile utviklinga. Vi finn at opplæring av ein multioppgåve-arkitektur med ein hjelp binær klassifikasjon-oppgåve som brukar ekstra augmenterte data beste oppnår dei ønskte effektane og generelliserer godt til ulike språk og kvalitetsmetrikk.', 'pl': 'Ocena jakości tłumaczeń maszynowych (QE) ma na celu zbudowanie modeli predykcyjnych do oceny jakości tłumaczeń generowanych maszynowo w przypadku braku tłumaczeń referencyjnych. Chociaż wykazano, że najnowocześniejsze modele QE osiągają dobre wyniki, nadmiernie opierają się one na cechach, które nie mają przyczynowego wpływu na jakość tłumaczenia. W szczególności wydaje się występować częściowa tendencja do przypisywania wysokiej jakości wyników tłumaczeniom, które są płynne i gramatycznie poprawne, chociaż nie zachowują znaczenia źródła. Bardziej szczegółowo analizujemy częściową tendencję wejściową i oceniamy cztery podejścia do wykorzystania zadań pomocniczych do łagodzenia tendencji. Dwa podejścia wykorzystują dodatkowe dane do informowania i wspierania głównego zadania, podczas gdy pozostałe dwa są przeciwne, aktywnie zniechęcając model do nauki uprzedzeń. Porównujemy metody pod kątem ich zdolności do zmniejszenia częściowego uprzedzenia wejściowego przy zachowaniu ogólnej wydajności. Uważamy, że szkolenie architektury wielozadaniowej z dodatkowym zadaniem klasyfikacji binarnej, które wykorzystuje dodatkowe dane rozszerzone, najlepiej osiąga pożądane efekty i dobrze uogólnia różne języki i wskaźniki jakości.', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө оруулах чадварын төсөөлөл (QE) нь машины хөрөнгө оруулсан хөрөнгө оруулалтын байхгүй байх үед машины хөрөнгө оруулсан хөрөнгө оруулалтын чадварыг тодорхойлох зо Урлагийн QE загварууд сайн үр дүнг олохын тулд харагдаж байгаа ч, тэд орчуулагчийн чанарын үр дүнд шалтгаан нөлөөлөхгүй чадваруудыг ихэвчлэн үнэлдэг. Ялангуяа, нэг хэсэг орноос харагдаж байгаа байх, яг энэхүү эх үүсвэрийн утгыг хадгалахгүй ч гэсэн, өндөр чанарын оноо нь шингэн, грамматик зөв орноос хэлж чаддаг. Бид үүнийг илүү нарийвчлалтай шинжилгээ хийж, тусламжтайгаа бууруулахын тулд тусламжтайгаар ашиглах 4 арга зам ашиглаж байна. Хоёр арга баримтууд гол даалгаварыг мэдээллээр, дэмжихийн тулд нэмэлт өгөгдлийг ашигладаг, нөгөө хоёр нь эсэргүүцтэй, загварыг ойлголтыг сурахын тулд идэвхтэй зогсоож байна. Эдгээр аргыг бид ерөнхий үйл ажиллагааг хадгалах үед нэг хэсгийг нь багасгах чадвартай харьцуулдаг. Бид олон ажлын архитектурыг суралцах нь нэмэлт нэмэлт өгөгдлийг ашигладаг хоёр дахин хоёр дахин хуваалцах ажлын тусламжтай, олон ажлын архитектурыг суралцах нь хүсэлтэй нөлөө, олон хэл, сайн чанарын метрик хү', 'ro': 'Estimarea calității traducerilor automate (QE) își propune să construiască modele predictive pentru a evalua calitatea traducerilor generate de mașină în absența traducerilor de referință. Deși s-a demonstrat că modelele QE de ultimă generație obțin rezultate bune, acestea se bazează prea mult pe caracteristici care nu au un impact cauzal asupra calității traducerii. În special, pare să existe o părtinire parțială a introducerii, adică tendința de a atribui note de înaltă calitate traducerilor care sunt fluente și corecte gramatical, chiar dacă acestea nu păstrează sensul sursei. Analizăm în detaliu distorsiunea parțială a intrării și evaluăm patru abordări pentru utilizarea sarcinilor auxiliare pentru atenuarea distorsiunii. Două abordări utilizează date suplimentare pentru a informa și sprijini sarcina principală, în timp ce celelalte două sunt adversare, descurajând activ modelul de a învăța părtinirea. Comparăm metodele în ceea ce privește capacitatea lor de a reduce distorsiunea parțială de intrare, menținând în același timp performanța generală. Considerăm că instruirea unei arhitecturi multitask cu o sarcină de clasificare binară auxiliară care utilizează date suplimentare augmentate obține cel mai bine efectele dorite și generalizează bine la diferite limbi și metrice de calitate.', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete prevoda mašine (QE) je cilj da izgradi predvidne modele da proceni kvalitet prevoda od mašine u odsustvu referentnih prevoda. Dok su modeli state-of-the-art QE pokazali kako bi postigli dobre rezultate, oni se previše oslanjaju na karakteristike koje nemaju uzrokovan uticaj na kvalitet prevoda. Posebno, izgleda da postoji djelomična pristrasnost ulaska, tj. tendencija da odredi visoke kvalitetne rezultate prevodima koje su tekuće i gramatično ispravne, iako ne sačuvaju smisao izvora. Analiziramo djelomičnu pristrasnost ulaska u daljnji detalj i procjenjujemo četiri pristupa za upotrebu pomoćnih zadataka za smanjenje pristrasnosti. Dva pristupa koriste dodatne podatke da bi obavijestili i podržali glavni zadatak, dok su ostale dvije neprijateljske, aktivno ometanje modela od učenja predrasude. Uspoređujemo metode s poštovanjem njihovih sposobnosti smanjiti djelomičnu pristrasnost ulaska dok održavamo ukupnu izvedbu. Nalazimo da obučavanje multitask arhitekture sa pomoćnom binarnom klasifikacijom koji koristi dodatne povećane podatke najbolje postiže željne efekate i generalizuje dobro na različite jezike i kvalitetne metrike.', 'so': "Qiimaanshaha tarjumaadda (QE) waxaa loogu talogaley in uu dhiso modello la hor-dhigo si ay qiimeeyaan qiimadda turjumaadda machine-generated iyadoon la'aanin turjumaadda reference. Inta lagu muujiyey tusaalooyinka QE-da-qoriga ah, waxay ku xiran yihiin faa'iido aan saameyn ku lahayn tijaabada turjumaadda. Si gaar ah, waxaa loola muuqanayaa qayb ka mid ah waxyaabaha la soo geliyo, waa qaab ay u fidiyaan tarjumaadda heerka sare oo si saxda ah, in kastoo aysan ilaalin micnaha asalka. Waxaannu si gaar ah u baaraynaa qeybta laga sameeyo, waxaana qiimeynaynaa afar qaab oo lagu isticmaalo shuqullada ku habboonaanta baahida. Two approaches use additional data to inform and support the main task, while the other two are adversarial, actively discouraging the model from learning the bias.  Waxaannu isbarbardhignaa qaababka ku saabsan awoodooda ay hoos u dhigi karto tababarka qeybta ah inta ay sii haystaan sameynta dhamaanka. Waxaynu heli nahay in lagu tababariyo dhismaha labaad oo kala duduwan, kaas oo isticmaalaya macluumaad dheeraad ah oo la kordhiyey waxyaabaha la jecel yahay, wuxuuna si wanaagsan u sameeyaa luuqado kala duduwan iyo noocyo kala duduwan.", 'sv': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) syftar till att bygga prediktiva modeller för att bedöma kvaliteten på maskingenererade översättningar i avsaknad av referensöversättningar. Även om toppmoderna QE-modeller har visat sig uppnå goda resultat, förlitar de sig över på funktioner som inte har någon orsakssamband på kvaliteten på en översättning. Framför allt verkar det finnas en partiell inmatningsfördelning, dvs. en tendens att tilldela högkvalitativa poäng till översättningar som är flytande och grammatiskt korrekta, även om de inte bevarar källans betydelse. Vi analyserar den partiella indatabiasen ytterligare i detalj och utvärderar fyra tillvägagångssätt för att använda hjälpuppgifter för att minska bias. Två tillvägagångssätt använder ytterligare data för att informera och stödja huvuduppgiften, medan de andra två är motstridiga och aktivt avskräcker modellen från att lära sig bias. Vi jämför metoderna med avseende på deras förmåga att minska partiell input bias samtidigt som den övergripande prestandan bibehålls. Vi anser att utbildning av en multi-task arkitektur med en extra binär klassificeringsuppgift som utnyttjar ytterligare utökad data bäst uppnår önskade effekter och generaliserar väl till olika språk och kvalitetsmått.', 'ta': 'இயந்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு தரம் கணக்கீடு (QE) எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு பாதிக்க இயந்திர உருவாக்கப் மொழிபெயர்ப்பின் தரத்தின் காரணமான பாதிப்பு இல்லாத தன்மைகளை மேல் நம்புகிறார்கள். குறிப்பிட்ட பாகமான உள்ளீட்டு பிரிவுகள் இருக்கிறது, அதாவது, மூலத்தின் அர்த்தத்தை சேமிக்கவில்லையானாலும் அதிக தரமான மதிப்புகளை மொழிப்பெயர்ப்புகளுக்க We analyse the partial input bias in further detail and evaluate four approaches to use auxiliary tasks for bias mitigation.  இரண்டு வழிகள் முக்கிய செயலை அறிவிக்க மற்றும் ஆதரிக்க கூடுதல் தரவை பயன்படுத்துகின்றன, மற்ற இரண்டு எதிரிகளாக இருக்கும் போது, பியாஸ மொத்த செயல்பாட்டை வைத்திருக்கும் பொழுது பாகமான உள்ளீட்டு பிரச்சனைகளை குறைக்க முடியும் முறையை ஒப்பி நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் அது ஒரு பல்படிக்கோரி உருவாக்கத்தை ஒரு கூட்டுதல் இருமுறை வகுப்பு பணியுடன் பயிற்சி செய்கிறது அது கூடுதல் கூட்டப்பட்ட தரவை பயன', 'si': 'යන්ත්\u200dර පරිවර්තන කුළුවත් අනුමාණය (QE) අදහස් කරනවා පරීක්ෂණ මොඩල් නිර්මාණය කරන්න යන්ත්\u200dර පරිවර්තන කුළුවත් පරිවර හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප විශේෂයෙන්, පේන විශේෂයෙන්, අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් අවශ්\u200dයයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, ඉතින්, අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් අවශ්\u200dයයක් අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් අවශ්\u200dයය සහ අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්නේ අංක ඇතුළු ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න, අංක ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් විස්තර කරන්න සහ අං ප්\u200dරධාන කාර්යය සහ උදව් කරන්න තවත් දත්ත දෙකක් භාවිතා කරන්න, අනිත් දෙකක් විරෝධිකයි, සක්\u200dරිය විරෝධිකයෙන් මොඩේ අපි ඒ විදියට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාසයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න අ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ ස්ථාපනයක් විසින් විශේෂ විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාවක් තියෙනවා කියලා විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විසි', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ کیفیت کا ارزش (QE) کا مطابق ہے کہ منظور ترجمہ کے غیر جانے کے مطابق ماشین کے پیدا کئے ہوئے ترجمہ کی کیفیت کا ارزش کرے۔ حالانکہ اچھے نتیجے پہنچ جانے کے لئے اچھے نمونے کی حالت کی QE نمونے دکھائے گئے ہیں، وہ بہت زیادہ ویژگی پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں جن میں کوئی ترجمہ کی کیفیت پر کوئی سبیل اثر نہیں ہے. مخصوصاً ایک حصہ اینپیٹ بیس بن رہا ہے، یعنی ایک ایسی توقع ہے جو زیادہ کیفیت اسکور کو ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے مقرر کرتی ہے جو سیاہ اور گراماتیکی طور پر درست ہیں، اگرچہ وہ سورج کا معنی نہیں رکھتے۔ ہم اضافہ تفصیل میں تقسیم کریں گے اور چار طریقے کا ارزش کریں گے کہ تقسیم کے ذریعے مددگار کام استعمال کریں۔ دو مطابق اضافہ ڈیٹا کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ اصلی کام کو بتانے اور حمایت کرنے کے لئے، اور دوسرے دو مخالف ہیں، موڈل کو بغیر سیکھنے سے فعال کر رہے ہیں. ہم طریقے کو ان کی قابلیت کے ساتھ مقایسہ کر رہے ہیں کہ ان کے سامنے پارٹی اینپیٹ بغیر کم کریں اور ان کے سامنے عملکرد کی حفاظت کریں۔ ہمیں یہ معلوم ہے کہ ایک مددگار دوئناری کلیسی ٹاکس کے ساتھ ملتی ٹاکس معمار کی تعلیم کرتی ہے جو اضافہ اضافہ ہونے والی ڈاکٹی کو اچھی طرح استعمال کرتی ہے، بہترین اثرات کو پہنچ سکتی ہے اور مختلف زبانوں اور کیفیت متریک کے', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Hullas, qismlar kiritish bajarilari ko'rinadi, balki manba ma'lumotning imkoniyatini saqlab qolmaydigan tarjimalarning yuqori darajaga ega bo'ladi. Biz bir qismlarni aniqlab ko'proq bajarilamiz va biz tashkilotni ishlatish uchun to'rtta usulni qiymatmiz. Ikkita usul asosiy vazifa haqida xabar berish va qoʻllash uchun qoʻshimcha maʼlumot yordamida foydalanadi, boshqa ikkita ishlatuvchisi juda foydalanadi, va modelni o'rganishdan foydalanadi. We compare the methods with respect to their ability to reduce the partial input bias while maintaining the overall performance.  Biz o'rganamiz, bir multiask maktablarini bir xil darajalashtirish vazifasi bilan o'rganamiz. Qoʻshimcha qoʻshimcha maʼlumot yordamida qo'shilgan maʼlumotni bajarishi kerak natijalarini bajaradi va har xil tillar va sifatning metriklariga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Máy tính Chất lượng Chất lượng Trung Dịch (cơ bản QE) nhằm xây dựng các mô hình dự đoán để đánh giá chất lượng dịch cỗ máy khi chưa có dịch bản dịch. Mặc dù các mô hình QE hiện đại có khả năng đạt được kết quả tốt, nhưng chúng dựa trên các tính năng không có tác động hệ thống về chất lượng của dịch vụ. Đặc biệt, có một thiên vị nhập có phần, tức là có xu hướng gán đi ểm chất lượng cao cho những bản dịch lưu loát và theo ngữ pháp chính xác, mặc dù nó không bảo tồn ý nghĩa của nguồn. Chúng tôi phân tích chi tiết sai lệch phần nhập và đánh giá kỹ bốn phương pháp sử dụng các công việc phụ để giảm thiểu thiên vị. Hai phương pháp dùng dữ liệu bổ sung để thông báo và hỗ trợ nhiệm vụ chính, trong khi hai phương pháp khác là đối nghịch, chủ động ngăn cản mô hình học khuynh hướng. Chúng tôi so sánh các phương pháp với khả năng của họ để giảm khuynh hướng nhập phần trong khi duy trì khả năng tổng hợp. Chúng tôi thấy huấn luyện một kiến trúc đa nhiệm với một nhiệm vụ phân loại nhị phân tích phụ, dùng các dữ liệu tăng cường thêm tốt nhất đạt được hiệu ứng mong muốn và phổ biến tốt cho ngôn ngữ và đo chất lượng khác nhau.', 'da': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) har til formål at opbygge prædiktive modeller til at vurdere kvaliteten af maskingenererede oversættelser uden referenceoversættelser. Mens topmoderne QE-modeller har vist sig at opnå gode resultater, er de overafhængige af funktioner, der ikke har en årsagssammenhæng på kvaliteten af en oversættelse. Især synes der at være en delvis input bias, dvs. en tendens til at tildele høj kvalitet scores til oversættelser, der er flydende og grammatisk korrekte, selv om de ikke bevarer kildens betydning. Vi analyserer den delvise input bias yderligere detaljeret og evaluerer fire tilgange til at bruge hjælpeopgaver til bias reduktion. To tilgange bruger yderligere data til at informere og understøtte hovedopgaven, mens de andre to er modstridende og aktivt afskrækker modellen fra at lære bias. Vi sammenligner metoderne med hensyn til deres evne til at reducere den delvise input bias samtidig med at den samlede ydeevne opretholdes. Vi finder ud af, at træning af en multitask arkitektur med en ekstra binær klassifikationsopgave, der udnytter yderligere forstærkede data bedst opnår de ønskede effekter og generaliserer godt til forskellige sprog og kvalitetsmålinger.', 'nl': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) heeft als doel voorspellende modellen te bouwen om de kwaliteit van machinegegenereerde vertalingen te beoordelen bij afwezigheid van referentievertalingen. Hoewel state-of-the-art QE modellen goede resultaten behalen, vertrouwen ze te veel op functies die geen causaal effect hebben op de kwaliteit van een vertaling. Met name lijkt er een partiële input bias te zijn, d.w.z. een neiging om hoge kwaliteit scores toe te wijzen aan vertalingen die vloeiend en grammaticaal correct zijn, hoewel ze de betekenis van de bron niet behouden. We analyseren de partial input bias nader en evalueren vier benaderingen om hulptaken te gebruiken voor bias mitigatie. Twee benaderingen gebruiken aanvullende gegevens om de hoofdtaak te informeren en te ondersteunen, terwijl de andere twee tegenstrijdig zijn, waardoor het model actief wordt ontmoedigd om de bias te leren. We vergelijken de methoden met betrekking tot hun vermogen om de partiële input bias te verminderen met behoud van de algehele prestaties. We vinden dat het trainen van een multitask architectuur met een aanvullende binaire classificatietaak die gebruik maakt van aanvullende augmented data het beste de gewenste effecten bereikt en goed generaliseert naar verschillende talen en kwaliteitsmetrics.', 'bg': 'Оценката на качеството на машинния превод (КЕ) има за цел да изгради предсказуеми модели за оценка на качеството на машинно генерирани преводи при липса на референтни преводи. Доказано е, че съвременните модели постигат добри резултати, но те разчитат на функции, които нямат причинно-следствено въздействие върху качеството на превода. По-специално, изглежда, че има частично отклонение на въвеждането, т.е. тенденция да се присвояват висококачествени оценки на преводи, които са плавно и граматически коректни, въпреки че те не запазват значението на източника. Анализираме частичното входно отклонение по-подробно и оценяваме четири подхода за използване на помощни задачи за смекчаване на отклоненията. Два подхода използват допълнителни данни, за да информират и подкрепят основната задача, докато другите два са противоречиви, което активно обезкуражава модела от изучаване на пристрастието. Сравняваме методите по отношение на способността им да намалят частичната входна отклонение, като същевременно поддържат цялостната производителност. Намираме, че обучението на многозадача архитектура с помощна задача за двоична класификация, която използва допълнителни разширени данни най-добре постига желаните ефекти и обобщава добре различните езици и показатели за качество.', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete prevoda strojeva (QE) cilja je izgraditi predvidne modele za procjenu kvalitete prevoda od strojeva u odsustvu referentnih prevoda. Iako su modeli stanja umjetnosti QE pokazali kako bi postigli dobre rezultate, oni se previše oslanjaju na karakteristike koje nemaju uzrokovan utjecaj na kvalitet prevoda. Posebno, izgleda da postoji djelomična pristrasnost ulaska, tj. tendencija za dodavanje visokokvalitetnih rezultata prevodima koje su tekuće i gramatično ispravne, iako ne očuvaju smisao izvora. Analiziramo djelomičnu pristrasnost ulaska u daljnje detalje i procjenjujemo četiri pristupa za upotrebu pomoćnih zadataka za smanjenje pristrasnosti. Dva pristupa koriste dodatne podatke kako bi obavijestili i podržali glavni zadatak, dok su ostale dvije neprijateljske, aktivno ometanje modela od učenja predrasude. Uspoređujemo metode s obzirom na njihovu sposobnost smanjiti djelomičnu pristrasnost ulaza dok održavamo ukupnu izvedbu. Nalazimo da obučavanje multizadatačne arhitekture sa pomoćnim binarnom klasifikacijom koji koristi dodatne povećane podatke najbolje postiže željne učinke i generalizuje dobro na različite jezike i kvalitetne metrike.', 'de': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) zielt darauf ab, prädiktive Modelle zu erstellen, um die Qualität maschinell generierter Übersetzungen ohne Referenzübersetzungen zu bewerten. Modernste QE-Modelle erzielen zwar gute Ergebnisse, setzen aber zu sehr auf Features, die keinen kausalen Einfluss auf die Qualität einer Übersetzung haben. Insbesondere scheint es einen partiellen Input Bias zu geben, d.h. eine Tendenz, Übersetzungen, die fließend und grammatikalisch korrekt sind, qualitativ hochwertige Noten zuzuweisen, obwohl sie die Bedeutung der Quelle nicht bewahren. Wir analysieren den partiellen Input Bias im Detail und evaluieren vier Ansätze zur Nutzung von Hilfsaufgaben zur Bias-Minderung. Zwei Ansätze nutzen zusätzliche Daten, um die Hauptaufgabe zu informieren und zu unterstützen, während die anderen beiden gegensätzlich sind und das Modell aktiv davon abhalten, den Bias zu lernen. Wir vergleichen die Methoden hinsichtlich ihrer Fähigkeit, den partiellen Input Bias bei gleichzeitiger Aufrechterhaltung der Gesamtleistung zu reduzieren. Wir finden, dass das Training einer Multitask-Architektur mit einer zusätzlichen binären Klassifikationsaufgabe, die zusätzliche erweiterte Daten nutzt, am besten die gewünschten Effekte erzielt und gut auf verschiedene Sprachen und Qualitätsmetriken verallgemeinert.', 'id': 'Perkiraan Kualitas Translasi Mesin (QE) bertujuan untuk membangun model prediksi untuk mempertimbangkan kualitas tradaksi yang dibuat oleh mesin tanpa tradaksi referensi. Sementara Model QE terbaik telah menunjukkan untuk mencapai hasil yang baik, mereka terlalu bergantung pada fitur yang tidak memiliki dampak penyebab pada kualitas terjemahan. Terutama, tampaknya ada bias input parsial, yaitu cenderung untuk mengatur skor kualitas tinggi untuk terjemahan yang fluent dan grammatikal benar, meskipun mereka tidak mempertahankan arti sumber. Kami menganalisis bias input parsial dalam rincian lanjut dan menganalisis empat pendekatan untuk menggunakan tugas bantuan untuk mengurangi bias. Dua pendekatan menggunakan data tambahan untuk memberitahu dan mendukung tugas utama, sementara dua lainnya adalah musuh, aktif menghindari model dari belajar bias. We compare the methods with respect to their ability to reduce the partial input bias while maintaining the overall performance.  Kami menemukan bahwa latihan arsitektur multitask dengan tugas klasifikasi binari bantuan yang menggunakan data tambahan yang ditambah yang terbaik mencapai efek yang diinginkan dan menyebarkan dengan baik ke bahasa dan metrik kualitas yang berbeda.', 'fa': 'ارزیابی کیفیت ترجمه ماشین (QE) هدف دارد که مدل پیش\u200cبینی بسازد تا ارزیابی کیفیت ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین تولید شود در غیر از ترجمه\u200cهای مربوط باشد. در حالی که مدلهای ایالت هنر QE برای رسیدن نتایج خوب نشان داده شده است، آنها به ویژه های زیادی اعتماد دارند که تاثیر دلیلی بر کیفیت یک ترجمه ندارند. مخصوصاً به نظر می\u200cرسد که تعادل ورودی پاره\u200cای وجود دارد، یعنی نقطه\u200cای برای تعریف نمودن نقطه\u200cهای کیفیت بالا به ترجمه\u200cهای سیاه و گرامی درست است، حتی با وجود اینکه معنی منبع را نگه نمی\u200cدارند. ما به جزئیات بیشتری از پاره\u200cای وارد شدن را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و چهار روش را برای استفاده از وظیفه\u200cهای کمک\u200cکننده برای کمک کردن تعطیلات تحریک می\u200cکنیم. دو دستور از اطلاعات اضافه برای اطلاعات و پشتیبانی از کار اصلی استفاده می\u200cکند، در حالی که دو نفر دیگر دشمنی هستند، فعالی از یادگیری این مدل از روی تغییرات ناتوان می\u200cکنند. ما روش\u200cها را با احترام توانایی آنها مقایسه می\u200cکنیم که در حالی که عملکرد عمومی را حفظ می\u200cکند، تغییر کند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که آموزش یک معماری بسیاری از کارها با یک کار مختصات دویینی کمک می\u200cکند که از اطلاعات افزایش بیشتری استفاده می\u200cکند، بهترین نتایج\u200cهای آرزوی را می\u200cرساند و به زبان\u200cهای مختلف و متریک کیفیت خوب می\u200cرساند.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Uwango wa Tafsiri wa Mashiniki (QE) unalenga kujenga mifano ya kutabiri ili kutathmini ubora wa tafsiri zilizotengenezwa kwa mashine katika kutokuwepo kwa tafsiri za maoni. Wakati mifano ya hali ya sanaa ya QE imeonyesha kupata matokeo mazuri, wanategemea sifa ambazo hazina athari kubwa kwa ubora wa tafsiri. In particular, there appears to be a partial input bias, i.e., a tendency to assign high-quality scores to translations that are fluent and grammatically correct, even though they do not preserve the meaning of the source.  Tunafanya uchambuzi wa upendeleo wa kidini kwa kina zaidi na kutathmini hatua nne za kutumia kazi za ushirikiano kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa upendeleo. Mifumo miwili inatumia taarifa za ziada za kutoa taarifa na kuunga mkono kazi kuu, wakati ambapo wengine wawili ni kinyume, na kwa haraka kuvutia mifano ya kujifunza upendeleo huo. Tunawalinganisha mbinu za kuhusiana na uwezo wao wa kupunguza upendeleo wa kidini wakati wa kuendelea utendaji wa jumla. Tunapata kwamba mafunzo ya majengo ya kutangaza multi yenye kazi ya usambazaji wa mbili za pamoja ambazo hutumia taarifa za ziada zilizoongezwa vizuri zinafanikiwa athari zinazohitajika na kuzalisha vizuri kwa lugha tofauti na viwango.', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i cilësisë së përkthimit të makinave (QE) synon të ndërtojë modele parashikuese për të vlerësuar cilësinë e përkthimeve të gjeneruara nga makina në mungesën e përkthimeve referuese. Ndërsa modelet e modernizuara QE janë treguar të arrijnë rezultate të mira, a to mbështeten tepër në karakteristika që nuk kanë një ndikim shkak në cilësinë e një përkthimi. Në veçanti, duket se ka një paragjykim të pjesshëm të hyrjes, që do të thotë një prirje për të caktuar rezultate të cilësisë së lartë për përkthimet që janë fluent e dhe grammatikisht të sakta, edhe pse a to nuk ruajnë kuptimin e burimit. Ne analizojmë paragjykimin e pjesshëm të hyrjes në detaje të mëtejshme dhe vlerësojmë katër metoda për të përdorur detyra ndihmëse për lehtësimin e paragjykimit. Dy qasje përdorin të dhëna shtesë për të informuar dhe mbështetur detyrën kryesore, ndërsa dy të tjerët janë kundërshtarë, duke zhgënjyer aktivisht modelin nga mësimi i paragjykimit. Ne i krahasojmë metodat lidhur me aftësinë e tyre për të reduktuar paragjykimin e pjesshëm të hyrjes duke mbajtur performancën e përgjithshme. Ne zbulojmë se trajnimi i një arkitekture shumëdetyrash me një detyrë ndihmëse të klasifikimit binar që përdorë të dhënat shtesë të shtuara arrin më së miri efektet e dëshiruara dhe gjeneralizon mirë në gjuhë të ndryshme dhe metrika cilësie.', 'af': "Masjien Vertaling Kwaliteit Estimasie (QE) doel om voorskou modele te bou om die kwaliteit van masjien genereerde vertalings te vurk in die absence van verwysing vertalings. Terwyl state-of-the-art QE-modelles vertoon word om goeie resultate te bereik, het hulle oor-vertrou op funksies wat nie 'n oorsaaklike effek het op die kwaliteit van 'n vertaling nie. In spesifieke is daar 'n gedeeltelike invoer voorbeeld wees, t.e. â\x80\x99n voorbeeld om hoë-kwaliteit telling te toewys na vertalings wat fluent en grammatiese korrek is, selfs al het hulle die betekening van die bron nie bevaar nie. Ons analyseer die gedeeltelike invoer voorbeeld in verdere gedeeltelike en evalueer vier toegange om hulpbeeldige opdragte te gebruik vir onderbeeldiging. Twee toegang gebruik addisionele data om die hooftaak te informasien en ondersteun, terwyl die ander twee teenstandaar is, aktiveer die model van die onderwerp te leer. Ons vergelyk die metodes met respek na hul moontlikheid om die gedeeltelike invoer voorbeeld te verminder terwyl die hele prestasie onderhou. Ons vind dat die onderwerp van 'n multitaak-arkitektuur met 'n hulp binêre klasifikasie-taak wat ekstra vergroot data beste gebruik word, bereik die gewende effekte en genereliseer goed na verskillende tale en kwaliteit-metriek.", 'ko': '기계번역품질평가(QE)는 번역문을 참고하지 않은 채 기계번역의 질을 평가하는 예측 모델을 구축하기 위한 것이다.가장 선진적인 양적완화모델은 이미 좋은 효과를 거두었다는 것이 증명되었지만, 번역의 질에 지나치게 의존하는 것은 인과관계가 없는 특징이다.특히 일부 입력 편차가 있는 것 같다. 즉, 원본 코드의 의미를 보존하지 않아도, 유창하고 문법이 정확한 번역을 위해 고품질 점수를 분배하는 경향이 있다.우리는 일부 입력 편차를 더욱 상세하게 분석하고 보조 임무를 사용하여 편차를 완화하는 네 가지 방법을 평가했다.두 가지 방법은 추가 데이터를 사용하여 주요 임무를 통지하고 지원하고 다른 두 가지 방법은 대항적이며 모델 학습의 편견을 적극적으로 막는다.우리는 이러한 방법들이 전체적인 성능을 유지하는 동시에 일부 입력 편차를 줄이는 능력을 비교했다.우리는 보조 2진법 분류 임무를 가진 다중 임무 체계 구조를 훈련시키는 것을 발견했다. 이 임무는 추가적인 증강 데이터를 사용하면 기대 효과에 가장 잘 도달할 수 있고 서로 다른 언어와 품질 지표에 잘 보급될 수 있다.', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjime kalitesi Taýýarlama (QE) maslahat çykyşlarynyň ýok terjime edilmediginde maşynyň üretilen terjime kalitesini çykarmak üçin önlennç modeller in şa etmegini amaçlaýar. QE nusgalary gowy netijeleri ýetmek üçin meýilleşdirýän bolsa, terjime etmegiň sebäbi täsiri ýok özelliklerine ynanýarlar. Aýratyn bolsa, daşaryk gabdalyk bir gabdalyk bolup görünýär, görnüşiniň howça-kwalitet sanlaryny terjime etmek üçin daşyrlyk we gramatik düzgün terjime etmek üçin bir terjime edilýär. Biz daşary girdi öngörünü daşyrak detaylarda çözümlendik we öngörünüşe küçürmek üçin kömek eden dört golaýy çözümlendik. Iki golaýy esasy zady bilgilemek we desteklemek üçin esasy maglumatlary ulanýar, beýleki ikisi rakip bolsa, nusgany öwrenmekden çykarýar. Bir şekilde, bu şekilde, bütün işlemleri korumak üzere, içeri giriş biaslerini azaltmak ukyplaryla karşılaştırıyoruz. Biz multi-täblik arhitektura arkadaşy binary klasifikasyýa täblisasy bilen öwrenip bilýäris. Diňe gowy gelişmiş maglumatlary gowy ulanýan netijelere we üýtgeşik dillere we kwalitet metriklere gowy gelip bilýäris.', 'hy': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) aims to build predictive models to assess the quality of machine-generated translations in the absence of reference translations.  Մինչդեռ ցույց է տվել, որ ամենաբարձր համակարգչային մոդելները լավ արդյունքներ են ստանում, դրանք չափազանց շատ են հիմնված այն հատկանիշների վրա, որոնք պատճառի ազդեցություն չունեն թարգմանության որակի վրա: Մասնավորապես, թվում է, որ կա մասամբ ներմուծի կողմնականություն, այսինքն, հակված է բարձր որակի գնահատականներ տրամադրել թարգմանություններին, որոնք հեշտ և գրամատիկապես ճիշտ են, չնայած դրանք չեն պահպանում աղբյուրի իմաստը: Մենք ավելի մանրամասն վերլուծում ենք մասամբ ներմուծի կողմնականությունը և գնահատում ենք չորս մոտեցումներ օգտագործելու կողմնականության նվազեցման համար: Երկու մոտեցումներ օգտագործում են ավելին տվյալներ հիմնական խնդիրը տեղեկացնելու և աջակցելու համար, մինչդեռ մյուս երկուսը հակառակորդ են, ակտիվ խոչընդոտում են մոդելը կողմնականության սովորելուց: Մենք համեմատում ենք մեթոդները նրանց կարողության հետ նվազեցնել մասամբ ներդրման կողմնականությունը, մինչդեռ պահպանում ենք ընդհանուր արդյունքը: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ բազմախնդիրների ճարտարապետության ուսումնասիրելը, որը օգտագործում է ավելացված տվյալներ, լավագույնն է հասնում ցանկացած էֆեկտներին և լավ ընդհանուր է տարբեր լեզուներն ու որակային մետրիկներին:', 'am': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) aims to build predictive models to assess the quality of machine-generated translations in the absence of reference translations.  የ-የ-አርእስት የQE ዓይነት ምሳሌዎች መልካም ፍሬዎችን ለማግኘት ሲታይ፣ በተርጓሜ ጥሩ ላይ ጥቅም የላቸውም በአፍሮቻቸው ላይ ይታመካሉ፡፡ በተለይም፣ የጥያቄ ጥያቄ፣ ምናልባት የኩነቶች ትርጓሜዎች ለትርጓሜዎች ትክክለኛ እና ለጥያቄ ጥያቄ ማድረግ የሚደረግ ጥያቄ ይታያል፡፡ የግንኙነት ጥያቄዎችን በተጨማሪነት እናሳውቃለን እና አራቱን የጥያቄ ስራዎችን ለመጠቀም እናስተውላለን፡፡ ሁለት ደረጃዎች የዋናውን ስራ ለማሳወቅ እና ለመደጋገም የሚጨምሩትን ዳታ ይጠይቃሉ፤ ሌሎቹ ሁለቱም ተቃዋሚዎች ናቸው፤ ሞዴል ተግባራውን ከመማር በመጠቀም ያሳስፋል፡፡ አካባቢውን የጥያቄውን ጥያቄ በመጠበቅ እናሳስባለን፡፡ የብዙቡክ መሠረት ማድረግ፣ በተጨማሪው ዳታ የሚጠቅመውን የልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋ እና ጥሩ ሚተርሚቶችን በመጠቀም እና ለልዩ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች እና ትክክል ማድረጊያውን በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም ይሻላል፡፡', 'az': 'Makinat Tərcümə Cənubiyyəti Tahməsi (QE) məqsədilə tədbir çevirilməsi yoxdur, makinat ürəkləndirilmiş tercümələrin keyfiyyətini təmin etmək üçün tədbir modelləri in şa etmək istəyir. QE modellərinin yaxşı sonuçlarını başa çıxarmaq üçün göstərilmiş halda, onlar təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar təkrar-təkrar çəkməyən özelliklərə təvəkkül edirlər. Özellikle, bir qismi girdi bias ı görünür, yoxsa yüksək kaliteli nümunələri təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlama təkrarlanmayaraq. Daha çox detaylarda parçacıq girdi tərzini analiz edirik və tərzini küçültmək üçün yardım işləri istifadə etmək üçün dörd tərzini değerləşdiririk. İki tərəflər ana işləri xəbərdar etmək və dəstəkləmək üçün çox məlumatları istifadə etmək üçün, digər ikisi tərəfdarlıq edir, modeli tərəfdarlıq öyrənməkdən fərqli olaraq istifadə edir. Biz metodları, bütün performanslarını qoruyarkən, bölüm giriş tərzini azaltmaq bacarıqlarına qarşılaşdırırıq. Biz çoxlu iş arhitektarını təhsil edirik ki, artıq artıqlı məlumatları istifadə edir, çoxlu işin arhitektarını təhsil edir və müxtəlif dillərə və kaliteli metriklərə yaxşı təhsil edir.', 'bn': 'মেশিন অনুবাদের মানের মান (কিউই) লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ভবিষ্যত মডেল তৈরি করার জন্য মেশিন-তৈরি করা অনুবাদের অনুবাদের অনুপস্থিতিতে মেশিনের কিউই মডেল ভাল ফলাফল অর্জনের জন্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু তারা বিশেষ করে নির্ভর করে যারা অনুবাদের মানে কোন কারণ প্রভাব নেই। বিশেষ করে মনে হচ্ছে আংশিক ইনপুটের বিরুদ্ধে, যেমন সূত্রের অর্থ সংরক্ষণ না করা উচ্চ মানের স্কোর বিনিময়ে অনুবাদ করার একটি প্রচণ্ড। আমরা আরো বিস্তারিত বিষয়টি বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন কাজ ব্যবহার করার জন্য চারটি পদক্ষেপ মূল্যায়ন করি। প্রধান কাজ জানানো ও সমর্থন করার জন্য আরো দুটি উপায় ব্যবহার করে, যদিও অন্য দুটি বিরোধী, কার্যকর ভাবে এই মডেলের বিরুদ্ধে শিক্ষা থ আমরা এই পদ্ধতিকে তুলনা করি তাদের পার্থক্যের ক্ষমতা কমিয়ে দিতে পারি আংশিক ইনপুটের বিরুদ্ধে তুলনায়। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে একটি অনেক মাল্টিটিক্যাক্টেক্টারের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে যা বিভিন্ন ভাষা এবং মানের মানের মাধ্যমে বাইনারি বিভিন্ন ক', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete prevoda mašine (QE) cilja je izgraditi predvidne modele za procjenu kvalitete prevoda od mašine u odsustvu referentnih prevoda. Iako su modeli state-of-the-art QE pokazali kako bi postigli dobre rezultate, oni se previše oslanjaju na karakteristike koje nemaju uzročnog utjecaja na kvalitet prevoda. Posebno, izgleda da postoji djelomična pristrasnost ulaska, tj. tendencija za dodavanje visokokvalitetnih rezultata prevodima koje su tekuće i gramatično ispravne, iako ne čuvaju smisao izvora. Analiziramo djelomičnu pristrasnost ulaska u daljnji detalj i procjenjujemo četiri pristupa za upotrebu pomoćnih zadataka za smanjenje pristrasnosti. Dva pristupa koriste dodatne podatke da bi obavijestili i podržali glavni zadatak, dok su druga dva neprijateljska, aktivno ometanje modela od učenja predrasude. Mi uspoređujemo metode s poštovanjem njihovih sposobnosti smanjiti djelomičnu pristrasnost ulaza dok održavamo ukupnu izvedbu. Nalazimo da obučavanje multitask arhitekture sa pomoćnom binarnom klasifikacijom koji koristi dodatne povećane podatke najbolje postiže željne učinke i generalizuje dobro na različite jezike i kvalitetne metrike.', 'cs': 'Cílem odhadu kvality strojového překladu je vytvořit prediktivní modely pro posouzení kvality strojově generovaných překladů v případě absence referenčních překladů. Zatímco bylo prokázáno, že moderní QE modely dosahují dobrých výsledků, příliš spoléhají na funkce, které nemají příčinný dopad na kvalitu překladu. Zejména se zdá, že existuje částečná verze vstupu, tj. tendence přiřazovat vysoce kvalitní skóre překladům, které jsou plynulé a gramaticky správné, i když nezachovávají význam zdroje. Podrobněji analyzujeme partiální vstupní bias a hodnotíme čtyři přístupy k využití pomocných úloh pro zmírnění bias. Dva přístupy využívají další data k informování a podpoře hlavního úkolu, zatímco ostatní dva jsou nepřátelské a aktivně odrazují model od učení se zaujatosti. Porovnáváme metody s ohledem na jejich schopnost snížit částečný vstupní bias při zachování celkového výkonu. Zjišťujeme, že trénink víceúlohové architektury s pomocnou binární klasifikační úlohou, která využívá další rozšířená data, nejlépe dosáhne požadovaných efektů a dobře zobecňuje různé jazyky a metriky kvality.', 'ca': "L'estimació de la qualitat de la traducció màquina (QE) mira a construir models predictius per avaluar la qualitat de les traduccions generades per la màquina sense traduccions de referència. While state-of-the-art QE models have been shown to achieve good results, they over-rely on features that do not have a causal impact on the quality of a translation.  En particular, sembla que hi ha un bias parcial d'entrada, és a dir, una tendència a assenyar puntuacions d'alta qualitat a traduccions fluents i gramàticament correctes, encara que no conservin el significat de la font. Analitzem el bias parcial de la entrada en detall i evaluem quatre enfocaments per utilitzar tasques auxiliars per a mitigar bias. Dos enfocaments fan servir dades adicionals per informar i sostenir la tasca principal, mentre que els altres dos són adversaris, desencorajant activament el model d'aprendre el bias. Comparem els mètodes en relació amb la seva habilitat de reduir el bias parcial d'entrada mentre mantenim el rendiment global. Trobem que formar una arquitectura multitasca amb una tasca de classificació binaria auxiliar que utilitza dades adicionals augmentates aconsegueix millor els efectes desitjats i generalitza-se bé a diferents llengües i mètriques de qualitat.", 'et': 'Masintõlke kvaliteedi hindamise (QE) eesmärk on luua prognoosivad mudelid masintõlkete kvaliteedi hindamiseks referentstõlkete puudumisel. Kuigi tipptasemel kvaliteedi tagamise mudelid on näidanud heade tulemuste saavutamist, tuginevad nad ülemääraselt funktsioonidele, millel ei ole põhjuslikku mõju tõlke kvaliteedile. Eelkõige näib olema osaline sisendi kalduvus, st kalduvus määrata kvaliteetseid skoore tõlketele, mis on sujuvad ja grammatiliselt õiged, isegi kui need ei säilita allika tähendust. Analüüsime üksikasjalikumalt osalist sisendi kallakut ja hindame nelja lähenemisviisi abiülesannete kasutamiseks kallakute leevendamiseks. Kahes lähenemisviisis kasutatakse põhiülesande teavitamiseks ja toetamiseks täiendavaid andmeid, samas kui teised kaks on vastastikused, mis takistavad mudelit aktiivselt eelarvamuste õppimisest. Me võrdleme meetodeid nende võime vähendada osalist sisendi kalduvust, säilitades samas üldise jõudluse. Leiame, et täiendavaid lisaandmeid kasutava binaarse klassifitseerimise abiülesandega mitmeülesandearhitektuuri koolitamine saavutab kõige paremini soovitud efektid ning üldistab hästi erinevatele keeltele ja kvaliteedimõõdikutele.', 'fi': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) pyrkii rakentamaan ennakoivia malleja konekäännösten laadun arvioimiseksi ilman referenssikäännöksiä. Vaikka viimeisimpien QE-mallien on osoitettu saavuttavan hyviä tuloksia, ne luottavat liikaa ominaisuuksiin, joilla ei ole syy-yhteyttä käännöksen laatuun. Erityisesti vaikuttaa olevan osittainen syöttövino eli taipumus antaa korkealaatuisia pisteitä käännöksille, jotka ovat sujuvasti ja kieliopillisesti oikeita, vaikka ne eivät säilyttäisi lähteen merkitystä. Analysoimme osittaisen syötteen vinoutumista tarkemmin ja arvioimme neljää lähestymistapaa aputehtävien käyttämiseen vinoutumisen lieventämiseen. Kahdessa lähestymistavassa käytetään lisätietoa päätehtävän tukemiseen ja informointiin, kun taas kahdessa muussa lähestymistavassa käytetään vastakkainasettelua, mikä estää mallia aktiivisesti oppimasta ennakkoluuloa. Vertaamme menetelmiä niiden kykyyn vähentää osittaista syöttövinoa säilyttäen samalla kokonaissuorituskyvyn. Havaitsemme, että lisättyä dataa hyödyntävän binääriluokituksen avulla monitehtäväarkkitehtuurin kouluttaminen saavuttaa parhaiten halutut vaikutukset ja yleistyy hyvin eri kielille ja laatumittareille.', 'he': 'הערכת איכות התרגשות מכונות (QE) מטרה לבנות דוגמנים צפויים כדי להעריך איכות התרגשות שנוצרות מכונות בהיעדרות התרגשות התייחסות. בעוד מודלים QE חדשים הוכחו להשיג תוצאות טובות, הם תלויים מדי על תכונות שאין להם השפעה סיבית על איכות התרגום. במיוחד, נראית שיש תמונת כניסה חלקית, כלומר, נטייה להוסיף נקודות איכות גבוהה לתרגשות שזורמות ונכונות גרמטית, למרות שהם לא שומרים על המשמעות של המקור. אנו מנתחים את ההתמחות החלקית בפרטים נוספים ולעריך ארבעה גישות להשתמש במשימות נוספות להקלת ההתמחות. שני גישות משתמשות בנתונים נוספים כדי להודיע ולתמוך במשימה הראשית, בעוד שני האחרים הם נוגדים, מנעילים באופן פעיל את המודל מללמד את ההתמחות. We compare the methods with respect to their ability to reduce the partial input bias while maintaining the overall performance.  אנו מוצאים שאימון ארכיטקטורה רבה משימות עם משימה ציבורית בינרית נוספת שמשתמשת בנתונים נוספים מגדלים הכי טוב להשיג את ההשפעות הלוואות ולהגנרל היטב לשפות שונות ומטריקות איכות.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name A lokacin da aka nuna misalin-state-the-art QU don ya sami matsalan mai kyau, sai su yi baka-ƙayyade feature waɗanda bã su da wani matsayi ga sifar translation. Tsammãnin, za'a sami wani rabon cikin shirin ayuka, misali, wa'anar ka ƙayyade nau'i masu nau'i wa fassarar da suka zama masu fassarar da gaske kuma ga grammaci, kuma kõ dã ba su tsare ma'anar source. Ana yi rabon surori masu cikin birai cikin bayani na bayani, kuma munã ƙaddara wasu hanyõyi huɗu da za'a yi amfani da aikin mataimaki ga mitarin bice. Two approaches use additional data to inform and support the main task, while the other two are adversarial, actively discouraging the model from learning the bias.  Munã samfan hanyoyin su da abincin su ƙara rabon inkircin da ke tsare surori da shi. Tuna gane cewa yana yin amfani da wasu matsayin multitaskar da wani aikin mai lissafa na dabar-biyu, wanda ke amfani da wasu data da aka ƙara yana da amfani da shi mafi ƙaranci ga amfani da zane-zane kuma yana ƙara mai kyau zuwa misãlai dabam-daban.", 'bo': 'Machine Translation Quality Estimation (QE) aims to build predictive models to assess the quality of machine-generated translations in the absence of reference translations. དེ་འབདཝ་ད་state-of-the-art QE དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པ་ལས་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག In particular, there appears to be a partial input bias, i.e., a tendency to assign high-quality scores to translations that are fluent and grammatically correct, even though they do not preserve the meaning of the source. A tendency to assign high-quality scores to translations that are fluent and grammatically correct, though they do not preserve the meaning of the source. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་ཟམ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མིན་གྲངས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་གནད་གནད་གནད་མེད་སྤྲོད་ཀ approaches two use additional data to inform and support the main task, while the other two are adversarial, actively discouraging the model from learning the bias. ང་ཚོས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་ཟམ་གང་ཡིན་པ་ཚོར་ཡོད། We find that training a multitask architecture with an auxiliary binary classification task that utilises additional augmented data best achieves the desired effects and generalises well to different languages and quality metrics.', 'sk': 'Cilj ocene kakovosti strojnega prevoda (QE) je graditi napovedne modele za oceno kakovosti strojno ustvarjenih prevodov v odsotnosti referenčnih prevodov. Medtem ko je bilo dokazano, da najsodobnejši modeli QE dosegajo dobre rezultate, se preveč zanašajo na značilnosti, ki nimajo vzročnega vpliva na kakovost prevoda. Zlasti se zdi, da obstaja delna vhodna pristranskost, tj. težnja, da se tekočim in slovnično pravilnim prevodom dodelijo visokokakovostne ocene, čeprav ne ohranjajo pomena vira. Podrobneje analiziramo delno vhodno pristranskost in ocenimo štiri pristope za uporabo pomožnih nalog za ublažitev pristranskosti. Dva pristopa uporabljata dodatne podatke za informiranje in podporo glavni nalogi, druga dva pa sta kontradiktorska, kar dejavno odvrača model od učenja pristranskosti. Metode primerjamo glede na njihovo sposobnost zmanjšanja delne vhodne pristranskosti ob ohranjanju splošne zmogljivosti. Ugotavljamo, da usposabljanje večopravilne arhitekture s pomožno opravilo binarne klasifikacije, ki uporablja dodatne povečane podatke, najbolje doseže želene učinke in dobro posploši v različne jezike in meritve kakovosti.', 'jv': 'Ngubah Inggal Karpaling nggambar (qE) kang njaluk nggawe model sing bisa perusahaan karo kalitas karo dolanan sing dibutuhke kapan karo pangunakan sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo nganggo tarjamahan. layers-action ngomong We are able to test the partial input bias in additional details and assess 4 accesses to use help tasks for bias minimation. iku Genjer Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan multitask karo akeh bantuan kanggo nguasai sistem sing paling dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang dhéwé kuwi nggawe data nambah sing luwih apik dhéwé luwih apik lan padha apik dhéwé, sing paling dhéwé uga luwih apik lan kaliwati metik.'}
{'en': 'Universal Conditional Masked Language Pre-training for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'التدريب المسبق على نص الكلام الموحد لترجمة الكلام والتعرف عليه', 'es': 'Capacitación previa unificada de voz y texto para la traducción y el reconocimiento de voz', 'fr': 'Pré-formation unifiée Speech-Text pour la traduction et la reconnaissance vocales', 'pt': 'Pré-treinamento de texto de fala unificado para tradução e reconhecimento de fala', 'ja': '音声翻訳と認識のための統一された音声テキスト事前トレーニング', 'zh': '语音译识同音文本预培训', 'hi': 'वाक् अनुवाद और पहचान के लिए एकीकृत वाक्-पाठ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण', 'ru': 'Предварительное обучение по унифицированному тексту речи для перевода и распознавания речи', 'ga': 'Réamhoiliúint Aontuithe Urlabhra-Téacs le haghaidh Aistriúcháin Cainte agus Aitheantas Cainte', 'ka': 'სხვადასხვა სიტყვა- ტექსტის წინასწარმატება სიტყვა- თავისუფლებისთვის', 'hu': 'Egységes beszéd-szöveg előképzés a beszédfordításhoz és -felismeréshez', 'el': 'Ενοποιημένη προετοιμασία ομιλίας-κειμένου για τη μετάφραση και αναγνώριση ομιλίας', 'it': 'Pre-formazione vocale unificata per traduzione e riconoscimento vocale', 'lt': 'Bendras kalbos teksto parengiamasis mokymas kalbos vertimui ir pripažinimui', 'mk': 'Преобука за преведување и препознавање на говорот за унифициран говор- текст', 'kk': 'Орындау және қабылдау үшін біріктірілген сөйлеу- мәтін алдындағы оқыту', 'ms': 'Pra-latihan Teks-Ucapan Bersatu untuk Terjemahan dan Pengenalan Ucapan', 'ml': 'സംസാര പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും യൂണിച്ചുള്ള വാക്ക്- പദാവലിയുടെ പ്', 'mt': 'It-taħriġ ta’ qabel għat-traduzzjoni u r-rikonoxximent tal-kelma u t-test tal-kelma unifikat', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн болон танихын тулд нэгдэл яриа-текст анхны сургалт', 'no': 'Førehandsvising av taletekst for taleomsetjing og gjenkjenning', 'pl': 'Ujednolicone szkolenie wstępne w zakresie tłumaczenia i rozpoznawania mowy', 'sr': 'Jedinstvena predobuka govornog teksta za prevod i priznanje govora', 'ro': 'Pregătire unificată pentru traducerea și recunoașterea vorbirii', 'si': 'වාර්තාවය සහ පුළුවන් වාර්තාව සඳහා සංවිධානය කතාව- පාළුවන් ප්\u200dරධානය', 'so': 'Waxbarashada u diyaarinta afka iyo aqoonsiga', 'ur': 'کلام کی ترجمہ اور پتپذیرش کے لئے یونیافیک کلام-ٹیکسٹ پیش تربین', 'sv': 'Unified Speech-Text Pre-training för talöversättning och igenkänning', 'ta': 'பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் அறியப்படுத்தலுக்கான ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட பேச்சு- உரை முன்னொட்ட பய', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hợp nhất Văn bản Trước huấn luyện Phát âm và nhận dạng', 'bg': 'Предварително обучение за превод и разпознаване на реч', 'da': 'Forenet tale-tekst foruddannelse til taleoversættelse og genkendelse', 'nl': 'Unified Speech-Text Voortraining voor spraakvertaling en -herkenning', 'hr': 'Jednostavna predobuka govornog teksta za prevod i priznanje govora', 'de': 'Unified Speech-Text Pre-Training für Sprachübersetzung und -erkennung', 'id': 'Unified Speech-Text Pre-training for Speech Translation and Recognition', 'ko': '음성 번역과 식별에 사용되는 통일된 음성 텍스트 사전 훈련', 'fa': 'آموزش پیش\u200cآموزش سخنرانی و متن متحده برای ترجمه و شناسایی سخنرانی', 'tr': 'Çykyş we Tanyş üçin Birleşik Sözler-Metin Öňki Taýramy', 'sw': 'Mafunzo ya Ujumbe wa Utafiti wa Utafiti na Utafiti wa Kireno', 'af': 'Geeenigde Spraak- Teks voor- oefening vir Spraak Vertaling en Herkenning', 'sq': 'Përgatitje për përkthimin dhe njohjen e fjalës për tekstin e unifikuar të fjalës', 'hy': 'Unified Speech-Text Pre-training for Speech Translation and Recognition', 'am': 'መግለጫ እና ማስረጃ', 'az': 'Sözlük Çeviri və Tanıma üçün Birləşdirilmiş Sözlük-Metni Ön təhsil', 'bn': 'ভাষা অনুবাদ এবং স্বীকৃতির জন্য একত্রিত ভাষা- টেক্সট পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ', 'ca': 'Preentrenament unificat de texto-fala per traducció i reconeixement', 'bs': 'Jedinička predobuka govornog teksta za prevod i priznanje govora', 'cs': 'Jednotné předškolení řeči a textu pro překlad a rozpoznávání řeči', 'et': 'Ühtse kõneteksti eelkoolitus kõneteksti tõlkimiseks ja tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Unified Speech-Text Pre-training for Speech Translation and Recognition', 'he': 'אימון מוקדם לטקסט-דיבור מאוחד לתרגום ולזיהוי דיבורים', 'sk': 'Predusposabljanje enotnega govornega besedila za prevajanje in prepoznavanje govora', 'ha': 'Unified Speech-Text Pre-training for Speech Translation and Recognition', 'bo': 'སྐད་འདིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་རྟོགས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ', 'jv': 'Wurung kelas Teks Perangkat Kemerdekaan kanggo Terjamah lan Kemerdekaan'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained sequence-to-sequence models have significantly improved Neural Machine Translation (NMT). Different from prior works where pre-trained models usually adopt an unidirectional decoder, this paper demonstrates that pre-training a sequence-to-sequence model but with a bidirectional decoder can produce notable performance gains for both Autoregressive and Non-autoregressive NMT. Specifically, we propose CeMAT, a conditional masked language model pre-trained on large-scale bilingual and monolingual corpora in many languages. We also introduce two simple but effective methods to enhance the CeMAT, aligned code-switching & masking and dynamic dual-masking. We conduct extensive experiments and show that our CeMAT can achieve significant performance improvement for all scenarios from low- to extremely high-resource languages, i.e., up to +14.4 BLEU on low resource and +7.9 BLEU improvements on average for Autoregressive NMT. For Non-autoregressive NMT, we demonstrate it can also produce consistent performance gains, i.e., up to +5.3 BLEU. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first work to pre-train a unified model for fine-tuning on both NMT tasks. Code, data, and pre-trained models are available at https://github.com/huawei-noah/Pretrained-Language-Model/CeMAT', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, descrevemos um método para pré-treinar em conjunto\nfala e texto em uma estrutura de modelagem de codificador-decodificador para tradução e reconhecimento de fala.\nO método proposto utiliza aprendizado multitarefa para integrar quatro subtarefas autosupervisionadas e supervisionadas para aprendizado multimodal.\nUma subtarefa de fala autossupervisionada, que aproveita dados de fala não rotulados, e uma subtarefa de texto para texto (auto)supervisionada, que faz uso de\ndados de treinamento de texto abundantes, ocupam a maior parte do tempo de pré-treinamento.\nDuas tarefas auxiliares de fala supervisionadas estão incluídas para unificar o espaço de modelagem de fala e texto.\nA análise detalhada revela a interferência de aprendizado entre as subtarefas. A fim de aliviar a interferência de subtarefas, duas configurações de pré-treinamento são propostas para tradução de fala e reconhecimento de fala, respectivamente.\nNossos experimentos mostram que o método proposto pode efetivamente fundir informações de fala e texto em um modelo. Ele alcança uma melhoria de 1,7 a 2,3 BLEU acima do estado da arte no conjunto de dados de tradução de fala MuST-C e WERs comparáveis ao wav2vec 2.0 na tarefa de reconhecimento de fala Librispeech.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous décrivons une méthode de pré-entraînement conjoint \nvoix et texte dans un cadre de modélisation encodeur-décodeur pour la traduction et la reconnaissance vocales. \nLa méthode proposée utilise l'apprentissage multitâche pour intégrer quatre sous-tâches auto-supervisées et supervisées pour l'apprentissage multimodalité. \nUne sous-tâche vocale auto-supervisée, qui exploite des données vocales non étiquetées, et une sous-tâche texte à texte (auto) supervisée, qui utilise \ndonnées d'entraînement textuelles abondantes, occupent la majorité du temps de pré-entraînement. \nDeux tâches vocales supervisées auxiliaires sont incluses pour unifier l'espace de modélisation vocale et textuelle. \nUne analyse détaillée révèle des interférences d'apprentissage entre les sous-tâches. Afin de réduire les interférences de sous-tâches, deux configurations de pré-entraînement sont proposées pour la traduction vocale et la reconnaissance vocale respectivement. \nNos expériences montrent que la méthode proposée peut fusionner efficacement des informations vocales et textuelles en un seul modèle. Il obtient une amélioration de l'UEBL de 1,7 à 2,3 au-dessus de l'état de l'art sur le jeu de données de traduction vocale MUst-C et des REE comparables à wav2vec 2.0 sur la tâche de reconnaissance vocale Librispeech.", 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نصف طريقة للتدريب المسبق بشكل مشترك\nالكلام والنص في إطار نمذجة وحدة فك التشفير لترجمة الكلام والتعرف عليه.\nتستخدم الطريقة المقترحة التعلم متعدد المهام لدمج أربع مهام فرعية تخضع للإشراف الذاتي والإشراف للتعلم عبر الوسائط.\nمهمة فرعية للكلام يتم الإشراف عليها ذاتيًا ، والتي تستفيد من بيانات الكلام غير الموسومة ، والنص الخاضع للإشراف (الذاتي) إلى مهمة نصية فرعية ، والتي تستفيد من\nبيانات تدريب نصية وفيرة ، تستغرق معظم وقت ما قبل التدريب.\nيتم تضمين مهمتي الكلام المساعدتين الخاضعتين للإشراف لتوحيد مساحة الكلام والنصوص.\nيكشف التحليل التفصيلي عن تدخل التعلم بين المهام الفرعية. من أجل التخفيف من تداخل المهام الفرعية ، تم اقتراح تكوينين قبل التدريب لترجمة الكلام والتعرف على الكلام على التوالي.\nتُظهر تجاربنا أن الطريقة المقترحة يمكن أن تدمج بشكل فعال معلومات الكلام والنص في نموذج واحد. يحقق ما بين 1.7 و 2.3 من تحسين BLEU أعلى من أحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية على مجموعة بيانات ترجمة الكلام MuST-C و WERs قابلة للمقارنة إلى wav2vec 2.0 في مهمة التعرف على الكلام Librispeech.', 'es': 'En este trabajo, describimos un método para preentrenar conjuntamente \nvoz y texto en un marco de modelado de codificador-decodificador para la traducción y el reconocimiento de voz. \nEl método propuesto utiliza el aprendizaje multitarea para integrar cuatro subtareas autosupervisadas y supervisadas para el aprendizaje entre modalidades. \nUna subtarea de voz autosupervisada, que aprovecha los datos de voz sin etiqueta, y una subtarea de texto a texto (auto) supervisada, que utiliza \nabundantes datos de entrenamiento de texto, ocupan la mayor parte del tiempo previo al entrenamiento. \nSe incluyen dos tareas auxiliares de voz supervisada para unificar el espacio de modelado de voz y texto. \nUn análisis detallado revela la interferencia del aprendizaje entre las subtareas. Con el fin de aliviar la interferencia de las subtareas, se proponen dos configuraciones de preentrenamiento para la traducción de voz y el reconocimiento de voz, respectivamente. \nNuestros experimentos muestran que el método propuesto puede fusionar eficazmente la información de voz y texto en un solo modelo. Logra una mejora de entre 1.7 y 2.3 BLEU por encima del estado de la técnica en el conjunto de datos de traducción de voz Must-C y los WER comparables a wav2vec 2.0 en la tarea de reconocimiento de voz Librispeech.', 'zh': '于此,述合预训练之法。 \n语音译识编码器-解码器建模框架语音文本。 \n所陈法用多任务学4自督子与督子整合,跨模态学。 \n一自监者,其用未标之语数,及一(自)监之文本,其用之也 \n富文本训练数据,据大半训练前日。 \n二佐监语,以一音文本建模间。 \n详细分析明子职之学。 为轻子职,分别语音译语二预训练。  \n实验明,法有效,合语音与文本信息于一模中。 其于MuST-C音译数据集上得1.7至2.3 BLEU改进,而于Librispeech语音相知与wav2vec 2.0等。', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम संयुक्त रूप से प्री-ट्रेन करने के लिए एक विधि का वर्णन करते हैं \nभाषण अनुवाद और मान्यता के लिए एक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडलिंग ढांचे में भाषण और पाठ। \nप्रस्तावित विधि क्रॉस मोडलिटी सीखने के लिए चार स्व-पर्यवेक्षित और पर्यवेक्षित उप-कार्यों को एकीकृत करने के लिए बहु-कार्य सीखने का उपयोग करती है। \nएक स्व-पर्यवेक्षित भाषण उप-कार्य, जो बिना लेबल वाले भाषण डेटा का लाभ उठाता है, और पाठ उपकार्य के लिए एक (स्वयं-) पर्यवेक्षित पाठ, जो उपयोग करता है \nप्रचुर मात्रा में पाठ प्रशिक्षण डेटा, पूर्व प्रशिक्षण समय के बहुमत ले लो. \nभाषण और पाठ मॉडलिंग स्थान को एकजुट करने के लिए दो सहायक पर्यवेक्षित भाषण कार्यों को शामिल किया गया है। \nविस्तृत विश्लेषण उप-कार्यों के बीच सीखने के हस्तक्षेप का खुलासा करता है। सबटास्क हस्तक्षेप को कम करने के लिए, क्रमशः भाषण अनुवाद और भाषण मान्यता के लिए दो पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण कॉन्फ़िगरेशन प्रस्तावित हैं।  \nहमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित विधि प्रभावी रूप से भाषण और पाठ की जानकारी को एक मॉडल में फ्यूज कर सकती है। यह MuST-C भाषण अनुवाद डेटासेट पर कला की स्थिति के ऊपर 1.7 और 2.3 BLEU सुधार और Librispeech भाषण मान्यता कार्य पर wav2vec 2.0 के लिए तुलनीय WERs के बीच प्राप्त करता है।', 'ja': '本作では、事前トレーニングを共同で行う方法について述べる。 \n音声翻訳及び認識のためのエンコーダ－デコーダモデリングフレームワーク内の音声及びテキスト \n提案された方法は、マルチタスク学習を利用して、クロスモダリティ学習のための4つの自主監督および監督されたサブタスクを統合する。 \nラベル付けされていない音声データを活用する自主監督音声サブタスクと、テキストサブタスクに（自己）監督テキストを使用し、 \n豊富なテキストトレーニングデータ、事前トレーニング時間の大部分を占めます。 \n音声およびテキストモデリング空間を統一するために、2つの補助的な監視された音声タスクが含まれています。 \n詳細な分析は、サブタスク間の学習干渉を明らかにします。 サブタスクの干渉を緩和するために、音声翻訳と音声認識のための2つの事前訓練構成がそれぞれ提案されている。  \n私たちの実験は、提案された方法が音声とテキスト情報を効果的に1つのモデルに融合させることができることを示しています。 それは、MuST - C音声翻訳データセット上の最先端の1.7から2.3のBLEU改善と、Librispeech音声認識タスク上のwav 2 vec 2.0と同等のWERを達成します。', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы описываем метод совместного предварительного обучения \nречи и текста в рамках моделирования кодировщика-декодера для перевода и распознавания речи. \nПредложенный метод использует многозадачное обучение для того чтобы интегрировать 4 собственн-надзираемые и контролируемые подзадачи для межмодального обучения. \nСамоконтролируемая речевая подзадача, которая использует немеченные речевые данные, и (самоконтролируемая) текстовая подзадача, которая использует \nобильные текстовые данные обучения,  занимают большую часть времени предварительного обучения. \nДля унификации пространства для речевого и текстового моделирования включены две вспомогательные задачи с контролем речи. \nПодробный анализ выявляет вмешательство в процесс обучения среди подзадач. Для того чтобы облегчить помехи подзадачи, предлагаются две предварительные конфигурации для перевода речи и распознавания речи соответственно.  \nНаши эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемый метод может эффективно объединять речевую и текстовую информацию в одну модель. Он достигает улучшения от 1,7 до 2,3 BLEU выше уровня техники на наборе данных MuST-C о переводе речи и сопоставимых WERs с wav2vec 2.0 на задаче распознавания речи Librispeech.', 'ga': 'San obair seo, déanaimid cur síos ar mhodh chun réamhthraenáil a dhéanamh i gcomhpháirt\nurlabhra agus téacs i gcreat samhaltaithe ionchódóra-díchódóra le haghaidh aistriúchán agus aithint cainte.\nBaineann an modh molta úsáid as foghlaim ilthasc chun ceithre fhothasc féinmhaoirsithe agus maoirsithe d’fhoghlaim trasmhodúlachta a chomhtháthú.\nFothasc cainte féinmhaoirsithe, a ghiaráil sonraí cainte neamhlipéadaithe, agus fothasc (féin)mhaoirsithe ó théacs go téacs, a bhaineann úsáid as\ngo leor sonraí oiliúna téacs, tóg an chuid is mó den am réamh-oiliúna.\nTá dhá thasc cainte chúnta maoirsithe san áireamh chun spás samhaltaithe cainte agus téacs a aontú.\nNochtann anailís mhionsonraithe trasnaíocht foghlama i measc na bhfothascanna. Chun cur isteach na bhfothasc a mhaolú, moltar dhá chumraíocht réamh-oiliúna le haghaidh aistriúchán cainte agus aithint cainte faoi seach.\nLéiríonn ár dturgnaimh gur féidir leis an modh atá beartaithe faisnéis chainte agus téacs a chomhcheangal go héifeachtach in aon mhúnla amháin. Baineann sé amach idir 1.7 agus 2.3 feabhsú BLEU thar an úrscothacht ar thacar sonraí aistriúcháin urlabhra MST-C agus WERanna inchomparáide go wav2vec 2.0 ar thasc aitheantais cainte Librispeech.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε μια μέθοδο για την κοινή προεκπαίδευση', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában leírjuk a közös előképzési módszert', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ აღწერეთ ერთადერთად სამუშაო სამუშაო', 'it': 'In questo lavoro, descriviamo un metodo per pre-formare congiuntamente', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа, опишуваме метод за заеднички предобука', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe apibūdiname metodą bendrai parengti mokymą', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде бір әдістерін', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami menggambarkan kaedah untuk bersama-sama melatih', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു ട്രെയിനില്\u200d കൂടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy opisujemy metodę wspólnego treningu wstępnego', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын хувьд бид холбогдох арга замыг', 'no': 'I denne arbeiden beskriver vi ein metode for å kopla med før tog', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem o metodă de pre-formare comună', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu opisujemo metodu zajedno pre voza', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි විශ්වාස කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න', 'sv': 'I detta arbete beskriver vi en metod för att gemensamt förbereda', 'so': 'Shaqadan, waxaynu ku qoraynaa qaab aan iskuul u wadano tareen-horaadka', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு முன் பயிற்சியில் ஒன்றாக விவரிக்கிறோம்', 'ur': 'ہم اس کام میں ایک طریقہ بیان کرتے ہیں کہ ایک طریقہ پیش ترین کے ساتھ', 'mt': 'In this work, we describe a method to jointly pre-train', 'uz': "Bu ishda, biz bir o'rganishdan oldin", 'vi': 'Trong công việc này, chúng tôi mô tả phương pháp tập trước', 'bg': 'В тази работа описваме метод за съвместно предтрениране', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu opisujemo način za zajednički predvoz', 'nl': 'In dit werk beschrijven we een methode om gezamenlijk voor te trainen', 'da': 'I dette arbejde beskriver vi en metode til fælles foruddannelse', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit beschreiben wir eine Methode zur gemeinsamen Vorausbildung', 'ko': '이 업무에서 우리는 연합예훈련 방법을 묘사하였다', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunaelezea njia ya pamoja ya treni', 'tr': 'Bu işde biz otlydan öňünden birleşmek üçin bir yöntemi tassyklaýarys', 'af': "In hierdie werk beskrywe ons 'n metode om saamstig voor-trein te beskrywe", 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne përshkruajmë një metodë për të paratrenuar së bashku', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ፣ የድረ ገበሬን ለመተባበር', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք միասին նախապատրաստման մեթոդը,', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menggambarkan metode untuk bersama-sama melatih', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما روش پیش از قطار را توصیف می کنیم', 'az': 'Bu işdə birlikdə tələb etmək üçün', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা একটা পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করি যেটা একসাথে ট্রেনের পূর্বে', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu opisujemo metodu za zajednički predvoz', 'cs': 'V této práci popisujeme metodu společného předtréninku', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame meetodit, kuidas ühiselt eeltreenida', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä kuvaillaan menetelmä yhteiseen esiharjoitteluun', 'ca': 'En aquesta feina, descrivim un mètode per a preparar conjuntament', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné rambarang ngerwih yèn arep banter', 'sk': 'V tem delu opisujemo metodo skupnega predvlakovanja', 'he': 'בעבודה הזאת, אנו מתארים שיטה להתקדם יחד', 'ha': "A cikin wannan aikin, muna bayyana wani metode da za'a haɗa pre-togi", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ཆག་སྔོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Achieving Reliable Human Assessment of Open-Domain Dialogue Systems', 'pt': 'Combine o roteiro, adapte se for multilíngue: analisando o efeito do pré-treinamento multilíngue na transferência multilíngue', 'es': 'Adaptar el guion, adaptarse si es multilingüe: análisis del efecto de la preformación multilingüe en la transferibilidad multilingüe', 'fr': "Faire correspondre le script, adapter s'il est multilingue\xa0: analyse de l'effet de la pré-formation multilingue sur la transférabilité entre les langues", 'ar': 'طابق النص ، تكييف إذا كان متعدد اللغات: تحليل تأثير التدريب المسبق متعدد اللغات على قابلية النقل عبر اللغات', 'ja': 'スクリプトの一致、多言語に適応する場合：多言語プレトレーニングがクロスリンガル転送可能性に与える影響の分析', 'hi': 'स्क्रिप्ट का मिलान करें, यदि बहुभाषी: क्रॉस-भाषी स्थानांतरणीयता पर बहुभाषी पूर्वप्रशिक्षण के प्रभाव का विश्लेषण करना', 'zh': '配脚本,宜多言:析多言,练可转移性也', 'ru': 'Соответствует сценарию, адаптируется, если многоязычный: анализ влияния многоязычного предварительного обучения на кросс-лингвистическую переводимость', 'ga': 'Meaitseáil an Script, Cuir in oiriúint más Ilteangach é: Anailís a dhéanamh ar an Éifeacht a bhíonn ag Réamhoiliúint Ilteangach ar Inaistritheacht Thrastheangach', 'hu': 'Match the Script, adapt if Multilingual: A többnyelvű eljárás hatásának elemzése a többnyelvű átvitelre', 'el': 'Ταιριάζει με το σενάριο, Προσαρμόστε αν είναι πολύγλωσσο: Ανάλυση της επίδρασης της πολύγλωσσης προεπιλογής στη διαγώνια μεταφορά', 'ka': 'სკრიპტის შესხვავება, თუ მრავალენგური შესხვავება: მრავალენგური შესხვავების ეფექტის ანალიზაცია', 'it': "Match the Script, Adapt if Multilingual: Analizzare l'effetto della pretesa multilingue sulla trasferibilità interlinguistica", 'kk': 'Скриптті сәйкес келетін, көптеген тілдер болса адаптациялау: көптеген тілдерді аудару мүмкіндіктерінің көптеген әсерін анализиялау', 'lt': 'Atitikti scenarijų, pritaikyti, jei jis yra daugiakalbis: analizuoti daugiakalbio mokymosi poveikį tarpkalbiniam perkeliamumui', 'mk': 'Одговарај со скриптот, Адаптирај ако е мултијазичен: Анализирање на ефектот на мултијазичното претренирање на крстојазичната трансферибилност', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്ക്രിപ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുക, പല ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ പ്രഭാവം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Padankan Skrip, Adapta jika Berbahasa: Menganalisis Kesan Penglatihan Berbahasa pada Pemindahan Berbahasa', 'mt': 'Taqbel mal-Iskriptu, Adatta jekk Multilingwi: Analiżi tal-Effett tat-Tħarriġ Multilingwi fuq it-Trasferibbiltà Translingwali', 'mn': 'Хэрвээ олон хэлний шинжлэх ухааны нөлөөг шинжлэх, олон хэлний шинжлэх ухааны нөлөөг шинжлэх', 'pl': 'Dopasowanie skryptu, dostosowanie jeśli jest wielojęzyczne: Analiza wpływu wielojęzycznego wstępnego treningu na przenoszenie między językami', 'no': 'Samsvar med skriptet, tilpass dersom fleirspråk: Analiserer effekten av fleirspråksområde på krysspråksområde', 'ro': 'Potrivirea Script-ului, adaptarea dacă este multilingvă: analizarea efectului pretențiilor multilingve asupra transferabilității interlingve', 'sr': 'Свпадај скрипту, адаптирај ако је многоязычно: анализирају ефект многоязычног претења на трансференцију крозезика', 'so': 'Match Script, Adapt if luqado badan: Analyzing Effectfect of Pre-training of luuqado badan on Transference Luqadaha Cross', 'si': 'ස්ක්\u200dරිප්ට් එක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් නම් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න: විශාල භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විශ', 'sv': 'Matcha skriptet, anpassa om flerspråkig: Analysera effekten av flerspråkig pretraining på tvärspråkig överföring', 'ta': 'பல மொழிகளின் விளைவு', 'ur': 'اسکریپٹ کے مطابق مطابق کریں، اگر Multilingual: Multilingual Pretraining Effect on Cross-Language Transferability', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khớp với Văn lệnh, Có thích nghi nếu đa ngôn ngữ: phân tích hiệu ứng của việc phun rộng', 'bg': 'Съвпадение със скрипта, адаптиране, ако е многоезичен: анализ на ефекта от многоезичното преобучение върху междуезичната преносимост', 'hr': 'Podudarajte skriptu, prilagodite ako se višejezički: Analizirajući učinak višejezičkog pretvaranja na transferabilnost preko jezika', 'nl': 'Het script aanpassen, indien meertalig aanpassen: het effect van meertalige pretraining op meertalige overdraagbaarheid analyseren', 'da': 'Match scriptet, tilpas hvis flersproget: Analyse af effekten af flersproget præcedens på tværsproget overførsel', 'de': 'Passen Sie das Skript an, adaptieren Sie wenn mehrsprachig: Analyse des Effekts von mehrsprachigem Vortraining auf die sprachliche Übertragbarkeit', 'ko': '스크립트 일치, 다국어일 경우 조정: 다국어 예훈련이 다국어 이동에 미친 영향 분석', 'fa': 'مسابقه به اسکریپت ، اگر بسیاری زبان را تغییر دهید: تحلیل اثر تغییر زبان\u200cهای زیادی روی قابلیت تغییر زبان\u200cهای زیادی', 'tr': 'Eskripti nezirle, eğer köp dilli: Çoklu dilli Çaprazlyk Etkisini Çözümle', 'af': 'Ooreenstem die Skrip, aanpassing indien veelvuldige tale: Analiseer die Effek van veelvuldige vordering op Cross- language Transferability', 'id': 'cocok dengan Skrip, Adaptasi jika Berbahasa: Analisasi Efek Perlatihan Berbahasa pada Transferasi Berbahasa', 'am': 'መጻሕፍትን አስተካክል፣ Multiቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ቢሆን ይተካክሉ: የብዙ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ በኩል መስመር-ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ጥቅም Analyzing', 'sq': 'Përpërshtat me Skriptin, Përpërshtat nëse Shumë-gjuhës: Analizimi i Efektit të Paramësimit Shumë-gjuhës në Transferueshmërinë Ndërgjuhësore', 'sw': 'Unganganisha Kitabu, Adapt if lugha nyingi: Anachambua Effective of Pretraining in lugha nyingi on Transfers in Cross', 'az': '∆Źg…ôr √ßoxlu dil istifad…ô ets…ôniz, Script il…ô uyńüunlayńĪn: √áift dill…ôrin Transferabilit…ôsi √ľz…ôrind…ô √ßoxlu t…ôhrif etkisini analiz edir', 'bn': 'স্ক্রিপ্টের সাথে মিশ্রিত করুন, মাল্টিভাষায় যদি প্রশিক্ষণ করুন: ক্রস- ভাষাভাষী পরিবহনের উপর বহুভাষী প্রশিক্ষণের প্রভাব ব ব', 'ca': "Compartir l'Escritura, Adaptar si Multilingüe: Analitzar l'efecte de la pré-formació multilingüe en la transferibilitat translingüe", 'hy': 'Համասարեցնել գրվածքը, հարմարեցնել եթե բազլեզու. բազլեզու նախադասության ազդեցության վերլուծում', 'cs': 'Přizpůsobit skript, přizpůsobit se vícejazyčnému: Analýza vlivu vícejazyčného předškolení na přenositelnost mezi jazyky', 'fi': 'Vastaa skriptiä, mukautu monikieliseksi: monikielisen esikoulutuksen vaikutuksen analysointi monikieliseen siirrettävyyteen', 'bs': 'Podudaraj skriptu, adaptiraj ako se višejezički: Analizira učinak višejezičkog pretvaranja na transferabilnost preko jezika', 'et': 'Skripti sobitamine, mitmekeelse kohandamine: mitmekeelse eelõpetamise mõju analüüsimine keeleülesele ülekantavusele', 'jv': 'Match Entire Word Only', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'תואם את התסריט, התאמן אם רבות שפות: ניתוח ההשפעה של התאמנות רבות שפות על העברות דרך שפות', 'sk': 'Ujemanje skripta, prilagajanje, če je večjezično: analiziranje učinka večjezičnega pretvarjanja na medjezično prenosljivost', 'bo': 'Match the Script, Adapt if Multilingual: Analyzing the Effect of Multilingual Pretraining on Cross-lingual Transferability'}
{'en': 'Evaluation of open-domain dialogue systems is highly challenging and development of better techniques is highlighted time and again as desperately needed. Despite substantial efforts to carry out reliable live evaluation of systems in recent competitions, annotations have been abandoned and reported as too unreliable to yield sensible results. This is a serious problem since automatic metrics are not known to provide a good indication of what may or may not be a high-quality conversation. Answering the distress call of competitions that have emphasized the urgent need for better evaluation techniques in dialogue, we present the successful development of human evaluation that is highly reliable while still remaining feasible and low cost. Self-replication experiments reveal almost perfectly repeatable results with a correlation of r=0.969. Furthermore, due to the lack of appropriate methods of statistical significance testing, the likelihood of potential improvements to systems occurring due to chance is rarely taken into account in dialogue evaluation, and the evaluation we propose facilitates application of standard tests. Since we have developed a highly reliable evaluation method, new insights into system performance can be revealed. We therefore include a comparison of state-of-the-art models (i) with and without personas, to measure the contribution of personas to conversation quality, as well as (ii) prescribed versus freely chosen topics. Interestingly with respect to personas, results indicate that personas do not positively contribute to conversation quality as expected.', 'ar': 'تتيح النماذج متعددة اللغات المحددة مسبقًا إمكانية التعلم بدون أي طائل حتى للغات غير المرئية ، ويمكن تحسين هذا الأداء بشكل أكبر من خلال التكيف قبل الضبط النهائي. ومع ذلك ، فمن غير الواضح كيف يؤثر عدد لغات ما قبل التدريب على التعلم النظيف للنموذج للغات غير المرئية أثناء التدريب المسبق. لسد هذه الفجوة ، نطرح أسئلة البحث التالية: (1) كيف يؤثر عدد لغات ما قبل التدريب على الأداء الخالي من الضربات على اللغات المستهدفة غير المرئية؟ (2) هل تتغير الإجابة على هذا السؤال مع تكييف النموذج؟ (3) هل تتغير نتائج سؤالنا الأول إذا كانت جميع اللغات المستخدمة في التدريب المسبق مرتبطة ببعضها البعض؟ تشير تجاربنا في التدريب المسبق على اللغات ذات الصلة إلى أن اختيار مجموعة متنوعة من اللغات أمر بالغ الأهمية. بدون تعديل النموذج ، من المستغرب أن تؤدي زيادة عدد لغات ما قبل التدريب إلى نتائج أفضل حتى إضافة اللغات ذات الصلة ، وبعد ذلك ثبات الأداء.\nعلى النقيض من ذلك ، مع تكييف النموذج من خلال التدريب المسبق المستمر ، فإن التدريب المسبق على عدد أكبر من اللغات غالبًا ما يعطي مزيدًا من التحسين ، مما يشير إلى أن تكييف النموذج أمر بالغ الأهمية لاستغلال لغات إضافية قبل التدريب.', 'pt': 'Modelos multilíngues pré-treinados permitem aprendizado de tiro zero, mesmo para idiomas não vistos, e esse desempenho pode ser aprimorado ainda mais por meio da adaptação antes do ajuste fino. No entanto, não está claro como o número de idiomas de pré-treinamento influencia o aprendizado de tiro zero de um modelo para idiomas não vistos durante o pré-treinamento. Para preencher essa lacuna, fazemos as seguintes perguntas de pesquisa: (1) Como o número de idiomas de pré-treinamento influencia o desempenho de tiro zero em idiomas de destino não vistos? (2) A resposta a essa pergunta muda com a adaptação do modelo? (3) As descobertas para nossa primeira pergunta mudam se os idiomas usados para o pré-treinamento estiverem todos relacionados? Nossos experimentos de pré-treinamento com idiomas relacionados indicam que a escolha de um conjunto diversificado de idiomas é crucial. Sem a adaptação do modelo, surpreendentemente, aumentar o número de idiomas de pré-treinamento produz melhores resultados até adicionar idiomas relacionados, após o qual o desempenho se estabiliza.\nEm contraste, com a adaptação do modelo por meio de pré-treinamento contínuo, o pré-treinamento em um número maior de idiomas geralmente oferece melhorias adicionais, sugerindo que a adaptação do modelo é crucial para explorar idiomas adicionais de pré-treinamento.', 'es': 'Los modelos multilingües preentrenados permiten un aprendizaje sin límites incluso para idiomas invisibles, y ese rendimiento se puede mejorar aún más mediante la adaptación antes del ajuste fino. Sin embargo, no está claro cómo el número de idiomas de preentrenamiento influye en el aprendizaje cero de un modelo para idiomas que no se ven durante el preentrenamiento. Para llenar este vacío, formulamos las siguientes preguntas de investigación: (1) ¿Cómo influye el número de idiomas de preentrenamiento en el rendimiento cero en idiomas de destino invisibles? (2) ¿Cambia la respuesta a esa pregunta con la adaptación del modelo? (3) ¿Cambian los resultados de nuestra primera pregunta si todos los idiomas utilizados para el preentrenamiento están relacionados? Nuestros experimentos sobre la formación previa con idiomas relacionados indican que es crucial elegir un conjunto diverso de idiomas. Sin la adaptación del modelo, sorprendentemente, el aumento del número de idiomas de preentrenamiento produce mejores resultados hasta agregar idiomas relacionados, después de lo cual el rendimiento se estabiliza.\nPor el contrario, con la adaptación del modelo a través del preentrenamiento continuo, el preentrenamiento en un mayor número de idiomas a menudo mejora aún más, lo que sugiere que la adaptación del modelo es crucial para aprovechar los idiomas adicionales de preentrenamiento.', 'fr': "Les modèles multilingues préentraînés permettent un apprentissage zéro, même pour les langues non vues, et ces performances peuvent être encore améliorées via une adaptation avant un réglage précis. Cependant, il n'est pas clair comment le nombre de langues de préformation influence l'apprentissage zéro d'un modèle pour des langues invisibles pendant la pré-formation. Pour combler cette lacune, nous posons les questions de recherche suivantes\xa0: (1) Comment le nombre de langues de préformation influence-t-il les performances zero-shot sur des langues cibles invisibles\xa0? (2) La réponse à cette question change-t-elle avec l'adaptation du modèle\xa0? (3) Les résultats de notre première question changent-ils si les langues utilisées pour la pré-formation sont toutes liées\xa0? Nos expériences sur la préformation avec des langues apparentées indiquent que le choix d'un ensemble de langues diversifié est crucial. Sans adaptation du modèle, étonnamment, l'augmentation du nombre de langues de pré-apprentissage donne de meilleurs résultats jusqu'à l'ajout de langues connexes, après quoi les performances atteignent des plateaux.\nEn revanche, avec l'adaptation du modèle via une préformation continue, la préformation sur un plus grand nombre de langues apporte souvent une amélioration supplémentaire, ce qui suggère que l'adaptation du modèle est cruciale pour exploiter des langues de préformation supplémentaires.", 'ja': '事前に訓練された多言語モデルは、見えない言語でもゼロショット学習を可能にし、そのパフォーマンスは微調整前の適応を介してさらに向上させることができます。 しかし、事前訓練言語の数が、事前訓練中に見えない言語のためのモデルのゼロショット学習にどのように影響するかは不明である。 このギャップを埋めるために、私たちは次の研究の質問をします。（ 1 ）事前トレーニング言語の数は、見えないターゲット言語のゼロショットのパフォーマンスにどのように影響しますか？ （ 2 ）その質問に対する答えは、モデルの適応によって変化しますか？ （ 3 ）事前トレーニングに使用される言語がすべて関連している場合、最初の質問の調査結果は変化しますか？ 関連する言語の事前トレーニングの実験では、多様な言語を選択することが重要であることが示されています。 モデルの適応がなければ、驚くべきことに、事前トレーニング言語の数を増やすと、関連する言語を追加するまでより良い結果が得られ、その後、パフォーマンスが向上します。\n対照的に、継続的な事前トレーニングによるモデル適応では、より多くの言語での事前トレーニングは多くの場合、さらなる改善をもたらし、モデル適応が追加の事前トレーニング言語を活用するために重要であることを示唆します。', 'zh': '先训者,虽不见之言成于零镜头学,而调于微调之前进一步提高性。 然尚未详预训练言语之数对预何损于言者零次性学。 补此空白,问:(1)预训语数,何损零射能? (2)其对,随形改编乎? (3)若以预训练之言皆相关,吾首变乎? 臣等实验言预练,择言至重。 令人讶之,若无模样改编,增预训语之数生佳,至添相关语,则性滞不前。\n比之以习,应之以言,明其应于言也。', 'hi': 'Pretrained बहुभाषी मॉडल अनदेखी भाषाओं के लिए भी शून्य-शॉट सीखने को सक्षम करते हैं, और उस प्रदर्शन को बेहतर बनाने से पहले अनुकूलन के माध्यम से और बेहतर बनाया जा सकता है। हालांकि, यह स्पष्ट नहीं है कि प्रीट्रेनिंग भाषाओं की संख्या प्रीट्रेनिंग के दौरान अनदेखी भाषाओं के लिए एक मॉडल के शून्य-शॉट सीखने को कैसे प्रभावित करती है। इस अंतर को भरने के लिए, हम निम्नलिखित शोध प्रश्न पूछते हैं: (1) पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण भाषाओं की संख्या अनदेखी लक्ष्य भाषाओं पर शून्य-शॉट प्रदर्शन को कैसे प्रभावित करती है? (2) क्या उस प्रश्न का उत्तर मॉडल अनुकूलन के साथ बदलता है? (3) क्या हमारे पहले प्रश्न के लिए निष्कर्ष बदलते हैं यदि प्रीट्रेनिंग के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषाएं सभी संबंधित हैं? संबंधित भाषाओं के साथ प्रीट्रेनिंग पर हमारे प्रयोगों से संकेत मिलता है कि भाषाओं के एक विविध सेट का चयन करना महत्वपूर्ण है। मॉडल अनुकूलन के बिना, आश्चर्यजनक रूप से, प्रीट्रेनिंग भाषाओं की संख्या में वृद्धि से संबंधित भाषाओं को जोड़ने के लिए बेहतर परिणाम मिलते हैं, जिसके बाद प्रदर्शन पठार होते हैं।\nइसके विपरीत, निरंतर प्रीट्रेनिंग के माध्यम से मॉडल अनुकूलन के साथ, बड़ी संख्या में भाषाओं पर प्रीट्रेनिंग अक्सर आगे सुधार देती है, यह सुझाव देते हुए कि मॉडल अनुकूलन अतिरिक्त प्रीट्रेनिंग भाषाओं का शोषण करने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है।', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные многоязычные модели позволяют изучать нулевой выстрел даже для невидимых языков, и эта производительность может быть дополнительно улучшена за счет адаптации до тонкой настройки. Тем не менее, неясно, как количество языков предварительного обучения влияет на нулевое обучение модели для языков, невидимых во время предварительного обучения. Чтобы заполнить этот пробел, мы задаем следующие исследовательские вопросы:  (1) Как количество языков предварительного обучения влияет на эффективность нулевого выстрела на невидимых целевых языках? (2) Изменяется ли ответ на этот вопрос с адаптацией модели? (3) Изменяются ли результаты для нашего первого вопроса, если языки, используемые для предварительного обучения, все взаимосвязаны? Наши эксперименты по предварительному обучению родственным языкам показывают, что выбор разнообразного набора языков имеет решающее значение. Удивительно, что без адаптации модели увеличение числа языков предварительного обучения дает лучшие результаты вплоть до добавления родственных языков, после чего появляются плато производительности.\nВ отличие от этого, с адаптацией модели посредством непрерывного предварительного обучения, предварительное обучение большему числу языков часто дает дополнительные улучшения, предполагая, что адаптация модели имеет решающее значение для использования дополнительных языков предварительного обучения.', 'ga': 'Cumasaíonn samhlacha ilteangacha réamhoilte foghlaim gan staonadh fiú i gcás teangacha nach bhfeictear, agus is féidir an fheidhmíocht sin a fheabhsú tuilleadh trí oiriúnú roimh mhionchoigeartú. Níl sé soiléir, áfach, cén tionchar a bhíonn ag líon na dteangacha réamhoiliúint ar fhoghlaim na samhla do theangacha nach bhfacthas riamh roimhe le linn na réamhoiliúint. Chun an bhearna seo a líonadh, cuirimid na ceisteanna taighde seo a leanas: (1) Cén tionchar a bhíonn ag líon na dteangacha réamhoiliúna ar fheidhmíocht náid ar sprioctheangacha nach bhfacthas riamh cheana? (2) An athraíonn freagra na ceiste sin de réir mar a oireann an tsamhail? (3) An athraíonn torthaí ár gcéad cheist má tá gaol idir na teangacha a úsáidtear le haghaidh réamhoiliúint? Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar réamhoiliúint le teangacha gaolmhara go bhfuil sé ríthábhachtach tacar éagsúil teangacha a roghnú. Gan oiriúnú don tsamhail, ní haon ionadh é, go mbíonn torthaí níos fearr ag méadú ar líon na dteangacha réamhoiliúint suas go dtí cur leis na teangacha gaolmhara, agus ardchlár feidhmíochta ina dhiaidh sin.\nI gcodarsnacht leis sin, le hoiriúnú múnla trí réamhoiliúint leanúnach, is minic a chuirtear feabhas breise ar réamhoiliúint ar líon níos mó teangacha, rud a thugann le tuiscint go bhfuil oiriúnú samhla ríthábhachtach chun leas a bhaint as teangacha réamhoiliúint breise.', 'el': 'Τα προσχεδιασμένα πολύγλωσσα μοντέλα επιτρέπουν την εκμάθηση μηδενικής εμβέλειας ακόμη και για τις αόρατες γλώσσες, και αυτή η απόδοση μπορεί να βελτιωθεί περαιτέρω μέσω προσαρμογής πριν από την τελειοποίηση. Ωστόσο, δεν είναι σαφές πώς ο αριθμός των γλωσσών προεπιλογής επηρεάζει την μηδενική εκμάθηση ενός μοντέλου για γλώσσες που δεν φαίνονται κατά την προεπιλογή. Για να καλύψουμε αυτό το κενό, θέτουμε τα ακόλουθα ερευνητικά ερωτήματα: (1) Πώς ο αριθμός των γλωσσών προεπιλογής επηρεάζει την απόδοση μηδενικού πυροβολισμού σε αόρατες γλώσσες στόχου; (2) Αλλάζει η απάντηση στο ερώτημα αυτό με την προσαρμογή του μοντέλου; (3) Αλλάζουν τα πορίσματα της πρώτης ερώτησής μας εάν οι γλώσσες που χρησιμοποιούνται για την προεπιλογή σχετίζονται όλες; Τα πειράματα μας σχετικά με την προετοιμασία με σχετικές γλώσσες δείχνουν ότι η επιλογή ενός διαφορετικού συνόλου γλωσσών είναι κρίσιμη. Χωρίς προσαρμογή μοντέλου, παραδόξως, η αύξηση του αριθμού των γλωσσών προεπιλογής δίνει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα μέχρι την προσθήκη σχετικών γλωσσών, μετά από τα οποία επίπεδα απόδοσης.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური მოდელები ჩართულია ნულ სტატის სწავლებას, როგორც არაჩვენებული ენებისთვის, და ეს კონფიგურაცია შეიძლება უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მაგრამ არ არის წარმოიდგინელი, როგორ წარმოიდგინული ენების რაოდენობა მოდელის ნულ სტატის სწავლების შესახებ ენებისთვის, რომლებიც არ შეიძლება წარმოიდგინოთ (1) როგორ იქნება საკუთარი საკუთარი ენების რაოდენობა, როგორ იქნება ნულ სტატის მუშაობა საკუთარი ენების შესახებ? (2) ამ კითხვის პასუხი შეცვლა მოდელური адаптаციის შესახებ? (3) ჩვენი პირველი კითხვის შესახებ ცვლილება თუ ყველაფერი საკითხვაში გამოყენებული ენები ყველაფერი შესახებ? ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც შესაბამისი ენათებით გამოყენებულია, იცის, რომ განსხვავებული ენათების ნაწილი გასაკეთებელია. მოდელური ადაპტიფიკაციის გარეშე, შესანიშნავია, რომ უფრო უფრო უკეთესი ენების რაოდენობა იქნება უფრო უკეთესი წარმოდგენების დამატებისთვის, რომელიც შემდეგ', 'hu': 'Az előkészített többnyelvű modellek lehetővé teszik, hogy a láthatatlan nyelvek számára is zéró tanulást tegyenek lehetővé, és ez a teljesítmény tovább javítható a finomhangolás előtti adaptációval. Nem világos azonban, hogy az előkészítést megelőző nyelvek száma hogyan befolyásolja egy modell nulla-shot tanulását az előkészítés során láthatatlan nyelvekre. Ennek a hiánynak a pótlása érdekében a következő kutatási kérdéseket teszünk fel: (1) Hogyan befolyásolja az előkészítést megelőző nyelvek száma a láthatatlan célnyelveken? (2) Változik-e e kérdésre adott válasz a modell alkalmazkodásával? (3) Változnak-e az első kérdésünk megállapításai, ha az előkészítés során használt nyelvek összefüggésben állnak? A kapcsolódó nyelvek előkészítésével kapcsolatos kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a különböző nyelvek kiválasztása döntő fontosságú. Modelladaptáció nélkül meglepő módon az előkészítést megelőző nyelvek számának növelése jobb eredményeket eredményez egészen a kapcsolódó nyelvek hozzáadásáig, amelyek után a teljesítménypladszok.', 'it': "I modelli multilingue pre-formati consentono l'apprendimento zero-shot anche per le lingue invisibili, e queste prestazioni possono essere ulteriormente migliorate tramite l'adattamento prima della messa a punto. Tuttavia, non è chiaro come il numero di lingue pre-formazione influenzi l'apprendimento zero-shot di un modello per le lingue non viste durante il pre-formazione. Per colmare questa lacuna, poniamo le seguenti domande di ricerca: (1) In che modo il numero di lingue di pre-formazione influisce sulle prestazioni zero-shot sulle lingue di destinazione invisibili? (2) La risposta a tale domanda cambia con l'adattamento del modello? (3) I risultati della nostra prima domanda cambiano se le lingue utilizzate per la preparazione sono tutte correlate? I nostri esperimenti sul pre-training con linguaggi correlati indicano che la scelta di un insieme diversificato di lingue è cruciale. Senza l'adattamento del modello, sorprendentemente, aumentare il numero di lingue di pre-formazione produce risultati migliori fino all'aggiunta di lingue correlate, dopo di che plateaus di prestazioni.", 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengti daugiakalbiai modeliai suteikia galimybę mokytis nuliniu atvaizdu net nematomų kalbų atvaizdu ir kad rezultatai gali būti toliau gerinami pritaikant juos iki patobulinimo. Tačiau neaišku, kaip išankstinio mokymo kalbų skaičius daro įtaką modelio nuliniam mokymuisi kalbomis, kurios nenustatytos išankstinio mokymo metu. Norėdami užpildyti šią spragą, mes užduodame šiuos mokslinius tyrimus: 1) Kaip išankstinio mokymo kalbų skaičius turi įtakos nenumatytoms tikslinėms kalboms? (2) Ar atsakymas į šį klausimą keičiasi pritaikant model į? (3) Ar mūsų pirmojo klausimo išvados keičiasi, jei kalbos, naudojamos išankstiniam mokymui, yra susijusios? Mūsų išankstinio mokymo su susijusiomis kalbomis eksperimentai rodo, kad labai svarbu pasirinkti įvairias kalbas. Nepažeidžiant modelio pritaikymo, nuostabu, kad didėjant ikimokyklinių kalbų skaičiui bus pasiekti geresni rezultatai, o vėliau bus pridėtos susijusios kalbos, po kurių bus pasiekti rezultatai.', 'mk': 'Претренираните мултијазични модели овозможуваат нула-снимка на учење дури и за невидени јазици, и дека изведбата може да се подобри понатаму преку адаптација пред финетирање. Сепак, не е јасно како бројот на претренирачки јазици влијае на нуларното учење на моделот за јазици кои не се видени за време на претренирањето. За да ја пополниме оваа празнина, ги поставуваме следните истражувачки прашања: (1) Како бројот на претренирачки јазици влијае на нула-снимката на невидливите јазици на целта? (2) Дали одговорот на тоа прашање се менува со прилагодувањето на моделот? (3) Дали заклучоците за нашето прво прашање се менуваат ако јазиците кои се користат за претренирање се поврзани? Нашите експерименти за претренирање со поврзани јазици покажуваат дека изборот на различни јазици е клучен. Без прилагодување на моделот, изненадувачки, зголемувањето на бројот на претренирачки јазици дава подобри резултати до додавање на поврзани јазици, по кои резултатите се исплатени.', 'kk': 'Көптеген тілдер үлгілері көрсетілмеген тілдер үшін да нөл түрлерді оқыту мүмкіндігін рұқсат етеді, және бұл әрекетті жаңарту алдында, адаптациялау арқылы жақсы жа Бірақ бұл тілдер үлгісінің бағытталмаған тілдер үшін нөл түрлерінің оқытуының нөл түрлері қалай нәтижесін білмейді. Бұл аралығын толтыру үшін, біз келесі зерттеу сұрақтарын сұрақ береміз: (1) Қалай тілдері көрсетілмеген тілдерге нөл түрлендіру әрекетінің саны? (2) Бұл сұрақтың жауабы үлгі адаптациялау үшін өзгертіледі бе? (3) Біздің бірінші сұрақ тілдерімізді өзгерту үшін табылған тілдер барлық қатынасы бар ма? Біздің тілдерімізге қатысты тәжірибелеріміз түрлі тілдерді таңдау үшін маңызды. Үлгі адаптациясы болмаса, әлі әлі көтерілген тілдер санын көтеру үшін қатынасыз тілдерді қосуға жақсы нәтижелер береді, соның соңында платаус шығарылады.', 'ml': 'പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒളിഞ്ഞ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല, അതിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും മുന്\u200d എന്നാലും മഴ പെയ്യുന്ന ഭാഷകളുടെ എണ്ണം എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഒരു മോഡലിന്റെ പൂജ്യത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് പ്രധാനപ്പെട ഈ വേര്\u200dപ്പ് നിറയ്ക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d തുടര്\u200dന്നുവരുന്ന പഠനത്തിന്റെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദിക്കുന്നു: (1) രഹസ്യമായ ലക്ഷ്യ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന (2) ആ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം മോഡല്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷനുമായി മാറുന്നുണ്ടോ? (3) നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d മാറ്റുമോ? ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷകളുമായി പെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക് മോഡല്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ, അത്ഭുതപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, പ്രചരിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകളുടെ എണ്ണം കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നത', 'ms': 'Model berbilang bahasa yang dilatih dahulu memungkinkan pembelajaran tembakan sifar walaupun untuk bahasa yang tidak terlihat, dan prestasi tersebut boleh diperbaiki lebih lanjut melalui penyesuaian sebelum penyesuaian. Bagaimanapun, tidak jelas bagaimana bilangan bahasa pratelajaran mempengaruhi pembelajaran 0-shot model untuk bahasa yang tidak terlihat semasa pratelajaran. Untuk mengisi ruang ini, kami bertanya soalan penyelidikan berikut: (1) Bagaimana bilangan bahasa pralatihan mempengaruhi prestasi tembakan sifar pada bahasa sasaran yang tidak terlihat? (2) Adakah jawapan soalan itu berubah dengan penyesuaian model? (3) Adakah penemuan soalan pertama kita berubah jika bahasa yang digunakan untuk latihan awal semua berkaitan? Eksperimen kita dalam latihan awal dengan bahasa berkaitan menunjukkan bahawa memilih set berbagai bahasa adalah penting. Tanpa penyesuaian model, yang mengejutkan, meningkatkan bilangan bahasa sebelum latihan memberikan keputusan yang lebih baik sehingga menambah bahasa berkaitan, selepas itu plateaus prestasi.', 'mt': 'Mudelli multilingwi mħarrġa minn qabel jippermettu tagħlim mingħajr skopijiet anki għal lingwi mhux viżibbli, u li l-prestazzjoni tista’ titjieb aktar permezz ta’ adattament qabel l-irfinar. Madankollu, mhuwiex ċar kif in-numru ta’ lingwi ta’ qabel it-taħriġ jinfluwenza t-tagħlim mingħajr skop ta’ mudell għal lingwi li ma jidhrux waqt it-taħriġ qabel. To fill this gap, we ask the following research questions:  (1) How does the number of pretraining languages influence zero-shot performance on unseen target languages?  (2) It-tweġiba għal dik il-mistoqsija tinbidel bl-adattament tal-mudell? (3) Is-sejbiet għall-ewwel mistoqsija tagħna jinbidlu jekk il-lingwi użati għat-taħriġ minn qabel ikunu kollha relatati? L-esperimenti tagħna dwar it-taħriġ minn qabel b’lingwi relatati jindikaw li l-għa żla ta’ sett differenti ta’ lingwi hija kruċjali. Mingħajr adattament mudell, b’mod sorprendenti, iż-żieda fin-numru ta’ lingwi ta’ qabel it-taħriġ tagħti riżultati aħjar sa ż-żieda ta’ lingwi relatati, u wara dan il-pjattaformi ta’ prestazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл загварууд нь анзаараагүй хэл дээр ч тэр загварыг сурах боломжтой болгодог. Энэ үйл ажиллагаа нь төгсгөлөөс өмнө дахин сайжруулах боломжтой болгодог. Гэхдээ хэлний тоо нь загварын тэр хэлний суралцах үед харагдахгүй хэлний суралцах нөлөөлдөг талаар тодорхойгүй. Энэ ялгааг дүүргэхийн тулд бид дараагийн судалгааны асуултуудыг асууж байна: (1) Нэгдсэн хэл дээр 0-шуудан үйл ажиллагаа хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг вэ? (2) Энэ асуултын хариулт загварын адилаар өөрчлөгдөж байна уу? (3) Бидний анхны асуултын ололтууд бүх хэл хамааралтай байвал өөрчлөгдөх үү? Бидний холбоотой хэл дээр шийдвэрлэх туршилтууд олон хэл сонгох нь чухал. Тиймээс загвар зохицуулалтгүй байх нь гайхалтай байдаг. Өнгөрсөн хэлний тоо нэмэгдүүлдэг нь харилцааны хэл нэмэгдүүлэхэд илүү сайн үр дүн гардаг.', 'ro': 'Modelele multilingve prepregătite permit învățarea zero-shot chiar și pentru limbile nevăzute, iar performanța poate fi îmbunătățită și mai mult prin adaptare înainte de reglare fină. Cu toate acestea, nu este clar cum numărul de limbi pre-formare influențează învățarea zero-shot a unui model pentru limbi nevăzute în timpul pre-formare. Pentru a umple acest decalaj, punem următoarele întrebări de cercetare: (1) Cum influențează numărul de limbi pre-instruire performanța zero-shot pe limbile țintă nevăzute? (2) Răspunsul la această întrebare se schimbă odată cu adaptarea modelului? (3) Constatările primei întrebări se schimbă dacă limbile utilizate pentru pregătire sunt toate legate? Experimentele noastre privind pregătirea limbilor conexe indică faptul că alegerea unui set divers de limbi este crucială. Fără adaptarea modelului, în mod surprinzător, creșterea numărului de limbi de pregătire generează rezultate mai bune până la adăugarea limbilor conexe, după care platourile de performanță.', 'no': 'Med fleirspråk-modeller kan du slå på læring av null-bilder sjølv for ugjennomsiktige språk, og at utviklinga kan forbetrast meir via adaptasjon før å finne ut. Det er imidlertid ukjent korleis talet på språk som påvirkar å lære null på eit modell for språk som ikkje er synleg under trekking. For å fylle dette mellomrommet, spør vi følgjande forskningsspørsmål: (1) Korleis antallet språk som gjer område påvirkar utviklinga av nullstilt på ukjende målspråk? (2) Er svaret på spørsmålet endra med modellen? (3) Er det oppdaga for det første spørsmålet våre endringane dersom språka som vert brukt for å trekke er alle relaterte? Eksperimentane våre for å prøve med tilhøyrande språk tyder på at velje ein ulike set språk er viktig. Utan modellen tilpassar blir det overraska å auka talet på språk som fører til betre resultat til å leggja til tilhøyrande språk, etter kva effekt plateaus.', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone modele wielojęzyczne umożliwiają naukę zero-shot nawet dla niewidocznych języków, a ta wydajność może być jeszcze bardziej poprawiona poprzez adaptację przed dopracowaniem. Nie jest jednak jasne, w jaki sposób liczba języków wstępnego treningu wpływa na zerową naukę modelu dla języków niewidocznych podczas treningu wstępnego. Aby wypełnić tę lukę, zadajemy następujące pytania badawcze: (1) W jaki sposób liczba języków wstępnego treningu wpływa na wydajność zero-shot w niewidzialnych językach docelowych? (2) Czy odpowiedź na to pytanie zmienia się wraz z adaptacją modelu? (3) Czy ustalenia naszego pierwszego pytania się zmieniają, jeśli języki używane do treningu wstępnego są ze sobą powiązane? Nasze eksperymenty dotyczące wstępnego treningu z językami pokrewnymi wskazują, że wybór zróżnicowanego zestawu języków jest kluczowy. Bez adaptacji modelu, co zaskakujące, zwiększenie liczby języków wstępnego treningu daje lepsze wyniki aż do dodania języków pokrewnych, po czym płaskowyży wydajności.', 'sr': 'Preklinjeni multijezički modeli omogućavaju učenje od nula čak i za nepoznate jezike, i da se izvedba može poboljšati putem adaptacije pre završetka. Međutim, nije jasno kako broj jezika pretkivanja utječe na učenje model a nula pucnjava za jezike koje nisu vidjele tokom pretkivanja. Da bi napunili ovu prazninu, postavljamo sljedeća istraživačka pitanja: (1) Kako broj jezika pretvaranja utječe na izvođenje nule pucnjave na nevidljive ciljne jezike? (2) Da li se odgovor na to pitanje mijenja sa model adaptacijom? (3) Da li se nalazi za naše prvo pitanje mijenjaju ako su jezici koji se koriste za pretkivanje povezani? Naši eksperimenti o pretkivanju sa povezanim jezicima ukazuju na to da je važno izabrati različit set jezika. Bez modela adaptacije, iznenađujuće, povećanje broja jezika pretkivanja pruža bolji rezultat do dodanja povezanih jezika, nakon kojih je provedba plateau.', 'so': "Tusaalada luuqadaha kala duduwan waxaa lagu baran karaa barashada nooca ah, xitaa luuqadaha qarsoon, taasina waxaa lagu beddeli karaa beddelista horumarinta ka hor inta aan dhalashada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ma ahan sida tirada luuqadaha soo daabacda ayaa saameyn ku yeelan kara barashada tusaale ahaan oo aan la muujin karo barashada luuqadaha oo aan la ogayn marka lagu soo daabaco. Si aan u buuxino burburkaas, waxaynu weydiinaa su'aalaha waxbarashada soo socda: (1) Sidee luuqada la soo daajiyo ayaa saameyn ku yeelan kara muuqashada nooca ah oo ku qoran luqadaha la garanayo? (2) Jawaabtii su'aalkaas ma bedeshaa in lagu beddelo sameynta modellka? (3) Shaqooyinka su'aalaha ugu horeeya ma beddeli karaan haddii luuqadaha lagu isticmaalayo in la xiriiro dhamaantood? Our experiments on pretraining with related languages indicate that choosing a diverse set of languages is crucial.  La'aantiis mid la beddelo tusaale ahaan la yaabo oo la kordhiyo tirada luuqadaha la soo daayo waxaa ka soo baxa sabab ka wanaagsan in lagu sii daro luuqadaha la xiriira, taas dabadeedna sameynta plateaus.", 'sv': 'Förutbestämda flerspråkiga modeller möjliggör noll-shot lärande även för osynliga språk, och denna prestanda kan förbättras ytterligare genom anpassning före finjustering. Det är dock oklart hur antalet förberedande språk påverkar en modells noll-shot lärande för språk som inte ses under förberedande utbildning. För att fylla denna lucka ställer vi följande forskningsfrågor: (1) Hur påverkar antalet förberedande språk noll-shot prestanda på osynliga målspråk? (2) Ändras svaret på denna fråga med anpassningen av modellen? (3) Ändrar resultaten för vår första fråga om alla språk som används för fortbildning är relaterade? Våra experiment med förbebildning med besläktade språk indikerar att valet av olika språk är avgörande. Utan modellanpassning ger det överraskande att öka antalet förberedande språk bättre resultat upp till att lägga till relaterade språk, varefter prestandaplatser.', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාවික මොඩේල්ස් සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය විදිහට අදහසන් නැති භාෂාව සඳහා ඉගෙනගන්න සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා, ඒ විදිහට විශ නමුත්, ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරින්ස් භාෂාවන්ගේ සංඛ්යා කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ නැති භාෂාවන්ගේ සුන මේ විශාලය සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න, අපි පස්සේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අහන්නේ: (1) කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු භාෂාවල් සුන්ධ (2) ඒ ප්\u200dරශ්නයට උත්තර වෙනස් කරනවද? (3) අපේ පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්නය වෙනුවෙන් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය වෙනස් කරනවද? අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සමග සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවන් සමග ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයා කරන්න පුළුවන් විවිධ භාෂ මොඩේල් සැකසුම් නැතුව, පුදුම විශ්වාසයෙන්, ප්\u200dරිට්\u200dරේන්ස් භාෂාවගේ සංඛ්යා විශාලනය කරනවා වඩා හොඳ ප්\u200dරත', 'ta': "பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பல மொழி மாதிரிகள் மறைக்கப்பட்ட மொழிகளுக்கும் கூட பூஜ்ஜியத்தை கற்றுக்கொள்ள இயலும் மற்றும் செயல்பாடு முன் However, it is unclear how the number of pretraining languages influences a model's zero-shot learning for languages unseen during pretraining.  இந்த இடைவெளியை நிரப்ப வேண்டுமானால் பின்வரும் ஆராய்ச்சி கேள்விகளை நாம் கேட்கிறோம்: (1) புரட்டி மொழிகளின் எண்ணிக்க (2) அந்த கேள்விக்கு பதில் மாதிரி ஒதுக்கீட்டுடன் மாறுகிறதா? (3) எங்கள் முதல் கேள்விக்கான கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் அனைத்து தொடர்புகளாக இருந்தால் மாறுமா? தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளுடன் மழைப்பது பற்றி எங்கள் சோதனைகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது பல மொழிகளை தேர்வு செய்வது முக்கியம். மாதிரி ஒழுங்குதல் இல்லாமல், ஆச்சரியப்படுத்தப்பட்டு, மொழிகளின் எண்ணிக்கையை அதிகரித்து, தொடர்புடைய மொழிகளை சேர்க்கும் முடிவ", 'ur': "بہت سی زبان کی مدلکوں نے صفر-شٹ کی تعلیم کو غیر دیکھی زبانوں کے لئے بھی امکان دی ہے، اور یہ عملکرد اضافہ کرنے سے پہلے اضافہ کر سکتا ہے۔ However, it is unclear how the number of pretraining languages influences a model's zero-shot learning for languages unseen during pretraining. اس جگہ پر پورا کرنے کے لئے ہم نیچے تحقیق سوال پوچھتے ہیں: (1) دھوپ کی زبانوں کی تعداد کس طرح غیر دیکھی موقع زبانوں پر zero-shot performance اثر دیتی ہے؟ (2) کیا اس سوال کی جواب موڈل کے ساتھ بدل رہی ہے؟ (3) کیا ہمارے پہلے سوال کے لئے تلاوت بدل دیتے ہیں اگر تمام زبانیں پرٹرین کے لئے استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں؟ ہماری آزمائش رابطہ دار زبانوں کے ساتھ آرام کرنے کے لئے نشان دیتی ہے کہ مختلف زبانوں کا انتخاب کرنا ضروری ہے۔ نمڈل اٹھانے کے بغیر، عجیب ہے، پرٹرین زبانوں کی تعداد اضافہ کرنے کی وجہ سے بہتر نتیجے اضافہ ہوتے ہیں، پھر اس کے بعد performance plateaus.", 'vi': 'Những mẫu giả dạng đa dạng sẵn sàng cho phép học bắn không ảnh ngay cả ngôn ngữ vô hình, và khả năng đạt được cải thiện thêm nhờ sửa chữa trước khi thẩm định. Tuy nhiên, vẫn chưa rõ làm thế nào mà s ố ngôn ngữ được sản xuất ra lại ảnh hưởng đến việc học súng không phát ra các ngôn ngữ không bị phát hiện. Để lấp đầy khoảng trống này, chúng tôi hỏi các câu hỏi thăm: 1) Làm thế nào số ngôn ngữ sản xuất trước có thể ảnh hưởng đến khả năng bắn không vào ngôn ngữ chưa từng thấy? (2) Liệu câu trả lời cho câu hỏi này có thay đổi bằng cách sửa mô hình? (3) Có phải những kết quả cho câu hỏi đầu tiên của chúng ta đều thay đổi nếu tất cả các ngôn ngữ dùng cho lớp mưa trước đều có liên quan? Những thí nghiệm sản xuất tại các ngôn ngữ có liên quan cho thấy việc chọn các ngôn ngữ khác nhau là rất quan trọng. Không cần sửa mô hình, ngạc nhiên là tăng số ngôn ngữ sản xuất sẽ có kết quả tốt hơn đến việc thêm ngôn ngữ liên quan, sau đó là đạt trình cao.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik tili modellari ichki gapiradigan tillar uchun hech narsa o'rganish imkoniyatini yordamida qo'llaydi, va bu bajarishni koʻpaytirishdan oldin ishlatish mumkin. Lekin, o'ylab o'rganish uchun modelning o'rganish nuqta o'rganishni o'zgartiradi. Bu gap toʻldirish uchun biz quyidagi taʼminlovchi soʻralar so'raymiz: (1) Bu tilni o'rganish soni qanday o'ylab ko'rinishi yoʻq gapiradigan tillarga o'zgarishni qanday qiladi? (2) Ushbu savol javob model adaptasi bilan oʻzgarishmi? (3) Bizning birinchi savol uchun natijalar hamma narsalar bilan bog'liq boʻlsa, oʻzgarishni istaysizmi? Ko'pchilik tillarni o'rganish uchun jarayonlarimiz turli tillarni tanlash muhim. Model o'zgarishni tasavvur qilishni tasavvur qilish mumkin, o'sha tilning soni ko'payishini ko'paytirish uchun bog'liq tillarni qoʻshish natijalarini bajaradi, keyin plateaus qo'shish mumkin.", 'hr': 'Preklinjeni multijezički modeli omogućavaju učenje nula snimka čak i za nepoznate jezike, i da se učenje može boljeti putem adaptacije prije finetuniranja. Međutim, nije jasno kako broj jezika pretkivanja utječe na učenje model a nule snimke za jezike koje nisu vidjele tijekom pretkivanja. Za ispunjavanje ovog praznina postavljamo sljedeća istraživačka pitanja: (1) Kako broj jezika pretvaranja utječe na učinkovitost nule pucnjave na nevidljive ciljne jezike? (2) Da li se odgovor na to pitanje mijenja s adaptacijom modela? (3) Da li se nalazi za naše prvo pitanje mijenjaju ako su jezici koji se koriste za pretkivanje svi povezani? Naši eksperimenti o pretresanju s povezanim jezicima ukazuju na to da je važno odabrati različit niz jezika. Bez modela adaptacije, iznenađujuće, povećanje broja jezika pretkivanja pruža bolji rezultat do dodanja povezanih jezika, nakon čega je provedba plateausa.', 'nl': 'Voorgetrainde meertalige modellen maken zero-shot leren mogelijk, zelfs voor onzichtbare talen, en die prestaties kunnen verder worden verbeterd door aanpassing voorafgaand aan finetuning. Het is echter onduidelijk hoe het aantal pre-training talen invloed heeft op het zero-shot leren van een model voor talen die tijdens pre-training ongezien zijn. Om deze lacune op te vullen stellen we de volgende onderzoeksvragen: (1) Hoe beïnvloedt het aantal pretraining talen de zero-shot prestaties op onzichtbare doeltalen? (2) Verandert het antwoord op die vraag met modellaanpassing? (3) Veranderen de bevindingen voor onze eerste vraag als de talen die worden gebruikt voor pretraining allemaal verwant zijn? Onze experimenten met pretraining met verwante talen geven aan dat het kiezen van een diverse set talen cruciaal is. Zonder modellaanpassing levert het verhogen van het aantal pretraining talen verrassend betere resultaten op tot het toevoegen van verwante talen, waarna prestatieplateaus.', 'da': 'Foruddannede flersprogede modeller muliggør nul-shot læring selv for usynlige sprog, og denne ydeevne kan forbedres yderligere via tilpasning før finjustering. Det er imidlertid uklart, hvordan antallet af forudgående sprog påvirker en models nul-shot læring af sprog, der ikke ses under forudgående undervisning. For at udfylde dette hul stiller vi følgende forskningsspørgsmål: (1) Hvordan påvirker antallet af forudgående sprog nulskudspræstation på usynlige målsprog? 2) Ændrer besvarelsen på dette spørgsmål sig med tilpasningen af modellen? (3) Ændrer resultaterne af vores første spørgsmål sig, hvis de sprog, der anvendes til foruddannelse, alle er relateret til hinanden? Vores eksperimenter med foruddannelse med beslægtede sprog indikerer, at det er afgørende at vælge et forskelligartet sæt sprog. Uden model tilpasning giver det overraskende nok bedre resultater at øge antallet af forudgående sprog op til at tilføje beslægtede sprog, hvorefter præstationsplateauer.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte mehrsprachige Modelle ermöglichen das Null-Schuss-Lernen auch für unsichtbare Sprachen, und diese Leistung kann durch Anpassung vor der Feinabstimmung weiter verbessert werden. Es ist jedoch unklar, wie die Anzahl der Vortrainingssprachen das Zero-Shot-Lernen eines Modells für Sprachen beeinflusst, die während des Vortrainings nicht gesehen werden. Um diese Lücke zu schließen, stellen wir folgende Forschungsfragen: (1) Wie beeinflusst die Anzahl der Vortrainingssprachen die Zero-Shot Performance auf unsichtbaren Zielsprachen? (2) Verändert sich die Antwort auf diese Frage mit der Modellanpassung? (3) Ändern sich die Ergebnisse unserer ersten Frage, wenn alle Sprachen, die für das Vortraining verwendet werden, verwandt sind? Unsere Experimente zum Vortraining mit verwandten Sprachen zeigen, dass die Wahl einer Vielzahl von Sprachen entscheidend ist. Ohne Modellanpassung führt die Erhöhung der Anzahl der Vortrainingssprachen überraschenderweise zu besseren Ergebnissen bis hin zum Hinzufügen verwandter Sprachen, woraufhin Leistungsplateaus resultieren.', 'id': 'Model berbagai bahasa yang dilatih sebelumnya memungkinkan pembelajaran zero-shot bahkan untuk bahasa yang tidak terlihat, dan prestasi tersebut dapat diperbaiki lebih lanjut melalui adaptasi sebelum penelitian. Namun, tidak jelas bagaimana jumlah bahasa prapelatihan mempengaruhi pembelajaran nol model untuk bahasa yang tidak terlihat selama prapelatihan. Untuk mengisi ruang ini, kami menanyakan pertanyaan penelitian berikut: (1) Bagaimana jumlah bahasa penelitian mempengaruhi prestasi zero-shot pada bahasa target yang tidak terlihat? (2) Apakah jawaban pertanyaan itu berubah dengan adaptasi model? (3) Apakah penemuan pertanyaan pertama kita berubah jika bahasa yang digunakan untuk latihan terlebih dahulu semua berhubungan? Eksperimen kita dalam pralatihan dengan bahasa yang berhubungan menunjukkan bahwa memilih berbagai set bahasa adalah penting. Tanpa adaptasi model, yang mengejutkan, meningkatkan jumlah bahasa prapelatihan memberikan hasil yang lebih baik hingga menambahkan bahasa yang berhubungan, setelah itu plateaus prestasi.', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 다중 언어 모델은 보이지 않는 언어에도 제로 렌즈 학습을 실현할 수 있고 미세하게 조정하기 전에 자체 적응을 통해 성능을 더욱 높일 수 있다.그러나 훈련 전 언어의 수량이 모델이 훈련 전에 볼 수 없는 언어의 제로 학습에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지는 아직 분명하지 않다.이 공백을 메우기 위해 우리는 다음과 같은 연구 문제를 제기했다. (1) 훈련 전 언어의 수량은 보이지 않는 목표 언어의 제로 사격 성적에 어떻게 영향을 줍니까?(2) 이 문제의 답안은 모델의 조정에 따라 바뀔까요?(3) 훈련 전에 사용한 언어가 모두 관련이 있다면 우리의 첫 번째 문제의 발견은 바뀔까요?우리가 관련 언어에 대한 예비 훈련 실험은 서로 다른 언어를 선택하는 것이 매우 중요하다는 것을 보여 준다.놀랍게도 모델 조정을 하지 않으면 예훈련 언어의 수를 늘리면 관련 언어를 추가할 때까지 성능이 정체될 수 있다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cهای پیش\u200cفرض می\u200cتوانند یادگیری صفر را حتی برای زبان\u200cهای ناشناخته توان دهند، و این عملکرد می\u200cتواند از طریق تغییرات قبل از تغییرات پیش\u200cفرض بهتر شود. ولی این مشخص نیست که تعداد زبان\u200cهای تغییر کردن چگونه برای یادگیری صفر از یک مدل برای زبان\u200cهای غیرقابل مشخص در زمان تغییر کردن تاثیر می\u200cدهد. برای پر کردن این فاصله، ما سوال تحقیقات را می پرسیم: (۱) تعداد زبانهای تحقیقات چگونه بر عملکرد صفر فشار در زبانهای هدف ناشناخته تأثیر می دهد؟ (۲) آیا پاسخ این سوال با تغییر مدل تغییر می\u200cکند؟ (۳) آیا نتیجه\u200cهای اولین سوال ما تغییر می\u200cدهند اگر زبان\u200cهای استفاده شده برای تغییر کردن همه\u200cی زبان\u200cها ارتباط دارند؟ آزمایش\u200cهای ما در پیشگیری با زبان\u200cهای مربوط به نشان می\u200cدهند که انتخاب مجموعه\u200cای از زبان\u200cهای مختلف بسیار مهم است. بدون تغییر مدل، تعجب کننده است که تعداد زبان\u200cهای پیش\u200cپرینس\u200cکننده\u200cای بهتر به اضافه زبان\u200cهای ارتباط می\u200cرسد، بعد از آن، پالاتاوس\u200cهای عملکرد.', 'sw': 'Mifano yenye mafunzo ya lugha mbalimbali inawezesha kujifunza sifuri hata kwa lugha za asili, na kwamba utendaji huo unaweza kuboreshwa zaidi kwa njia ya kuboresha kabla ya kupata uzazi. Hata hivyo, haijaweka wazi jinsi idadi ya lugha za kutengeneza inavyoathiri kujifunza kwa mifano isiyo na sifa kwa lugha zisizo na ufafanuzi wakati wa kutengeneza matumizi. Ili kutimiza mpango huu, tunauliza maswali yafuatayo ya utafiti: (2) Je, jibu la swali hilo linabadilika na kubadilisha mifano? (3) Je, matokeo ya maswali yetu ya kwanza yanabadilika kama lugha zinazotumiwa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza matumizi yote yanahusiana? Majaribio yetu kuhusu kutengeneza lugha zinazohusiana inaonyesha kuwa kuchagua aina mbalimbali za lugha ni muhimu. Bila kubadilishwa kwa mifano, kwa kushangaza, kuongezeka kwa idadi ya lugha za kudanganya zinaleta matokeo mazuri zaidi ya kuongeza lugha zinazohusiana, baada ya kufanya kazi.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe dilli nusgalary gözden çykyp bilmeden diller üçin hem zero atly öwrenmesini mümkin edip bilýär we şol işaretler bitirmeden öňünden öň adaptasiýa bilen gowylaşdirilip bilýär. Ýagna görä, ýakyn dilleriniň nähili görkezilmedik diller üçin örän täsir etmäge meňzeş. Bu boşluky doldurmak üçin, biz indiki araştyrmalar soraglary soraýarız: (1) Görkezilmedik hedef dillerinde nähili süýtgetmek isleýän diller nädip täsirleýär? (2) Bu soraga nusga adaptasyon bilen üýtgedip barmy? (3) Öňki soragymyzyň tapylyklary barmy, eger diller baglanmak üçin ullanýan bolsa? Çeşitli diller bilen öňlenmek üçin deneylerimiz dürli dilleri saýlamak örän wajypdyr. Model adaptasy bolmasa, geň şaşırtýar, ýakynlaşyk dilleriniň sanyny artdyrmak üçin ýakynlaşyk dillerini eklemek üçin has gowy netijesi bolar we olaryň soňra plateaus çykyş edip bilýär.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените многоезични модели позволяват нулево обучение дори за невидими езици и тази производителност може да бъде допълнително подобрена чрез адаптация преди фината настройка. Въпреки това, не е ясно как броят на езиците, които се обучават преди обучението, влияе върху нулевото обучение на модела за езици, невидими по време на предобучението. За да запълним тази празнина, задаваме следните изследователски въпроси: (1) Как броят на езиците, които се подготвят за обучение, влияе върху ефективността на нулевия изстрел на невидими целеви езици? 2) Отговорът на този въпрос променя ли се с адаптирането на модела? (3) Променят ли се констатациите за първия ни въпрос, ако езиците, използвани за предобучение, са свързани? Нашите експерименти за предобучение със сродни езици показват, че изборът на разнообразен набор от езици е от решаващо значение. Без адаптация на модела, изненадващо, увеличаването на броя на езиците за предобучение дава по-добри резултати до добавянето на сродни езици, след което ефективността плаща.', 'af': "Gevorderde multitaalse modele aktiveer nul-skoot leer selfs vir ongesiende tale, en daardie prestasie kan verder verbeter word deur aanpassing voor die finetuning. Maar dit is onbekende hoe die aantal voortrekende tale 'n model se nulskoot leer vir tale wat onverskyn is tydens voortreking. Om hierdie gap te vul, vra ons die volgende forskingspraak: (1) Hoe influens die aantal voortrekende tale nul-skoot prestasie op ongesiende doel tale? (2) Het die antwoord na daardie vraag verander met model aanpassing? (3) Het die gevindings vir ons eerste vraag verander as die tale wat gebruik word vir voorskrywing almal verwante is? Ons eksperimente om te trek met verwante tale indiek dat die kies van 'n verskillende stel tale is gekruisig. Sonder model aanpassing, verwonderbaar, verhoog die aantal voortrekende tale wat beter resultate gee tot verwante tale byvoeg, ná watter prestasie plateaus.", 'sq': 'Modelet shumëgjuhësore të parastërvitura mundësojnë mësimin zero-shot edhe për gjuhët e padukshme dhe se shfaqja mund të përmirësohet më tej nëpërmjet përshtatjes përpara përmirësimit. Megjithatë, nuk është e qartë se si numri i gjuhëve të parastërvitjes ndikon në mësimin zero-shot të një modeli për gjuhët e padukshme gjatë parastërvitjes. Për të mbushur këtë boshllëk, ne bëjmë pyetjet e ardhshme të kërkimit: (1) Si ndikon numri i gjuhëve të paramësuara në paraqitjen zero-shot në gjuhët e padukshme objektive? (2) A ndryshon përgjigja për këtë pyetje me adaptimin e modelit? (3) A ndryshojnë gjetjet për pyetjen tonë të parë nëse gjuhët e përdorura për paramësimin janë të gjitha të lidhura? Our experiments on pretraining with related languages indicate that choosing a diverse set of languages is crucial.  Without model adaptation, surprisingly, increasing the number of pretraining languages yields better results up to adding related languages, after which performance plateaus.', 'hy': 'Առաջինս վարժեցված բազմալեզու մոդելները թույլ են տալիս զրոյական ուսումնասիրություն նույնիսկ անտեսանելի լեզուների դեպքում, և այդ արտադրողությունը կարող է ավելի լավ բարելավվել հարմարեցման միջոցով մինչև փոփոխությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, անհասկանալի չէ, թե ինչպես է նախադասական լեզուների թիվը ազդում մոդելի զրոյի ուսումնասիրության վրա լեզուների համար, որոնք նախադասական ուսումնասիրության ժամանակ չեն տեսնում: Այս տարբերությունը լցնելու համար մենք հարցնում ենք հետևյալ հետազոտություններ․ (1) Ինչպե՞ս է նախադասական լեզուների թիվը ազդում զրոյի արդյունքների վրա անտեսանելի լեզուների վրա։ (2) Does the answer to that question change with model adaptation?  (3) Արդյո՞ք մեր առաջին հարցի արդյունքները փոխվում են, եթե բոլոր լեզուները, որոնք օգտագործվում են նախադասության համար, կապված են: Մեր փորձարկումները կապված լեզուներով նախադասավանդման վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ տարբեր լեզուների ընտրությունը կարևոր է: Առանց մոդելների ադապտացիայի, զարմանալի է, որ նախկին դասավանդվող լեզուների թիվը աճելը ավելի լավ արդյունք է տալիս մինչև հարաբերված լեզուներ ավելացնելը, որից հետո արդյունավետության մակարդակները:', 'az': 'Müxtəlif çoxlu dil modelləri görmədikləri dillərə də sıfır-shot öyrənməsini fəallaşdırar və bu performansı daha yaxşılaşdıra bilər. Halbuki, əvvəlki dillərin sayıs ı modellərin sıfır-fəsad öyrənməsi üçün müəyyən dillər üçün necə etkilidir? Bu boşluğu doldurmaq üçün, biz bu araştırma suallarını soruşuruq: (1) Görünmədən məqsəd dillərində sıfır-shot performansını necə etkilər? (2) Bu sualın cavabı modeli adaptasiya ilə dəyişir mi? (3) İlk sualımızın axtarışları dəyişiklik edir, əgər təkrar dillərinin hamısı əlaqədir? Bizim müxtəlif dillərlə birlikdə təmizlənmək təcrübələrimiz müxtəlif dilləri seçmək çox vacib olduğunu göstərir. Model uyğunlaşdırma olmadan, təəccüblü olaraq, pretraining dillərin sayısını artırmaq daha yaxşı sonuçları olar ki, bunun ardınca baş verən dilləri artırmaq üçün daha yaxşı sonuçlar verir.', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষিত বহুভাষাভাষী মডেলও অদৃশ্য ভাষার জন্য এমনকি শুট শিক্ষা সক্রিয় করে এবং ফিন্টুয়েশনের পূর্বে এই প্রদর্শনের মাধ্যমে আরো উন তবে এটা পরিষ্কার নয় কিভাবে ভাষার ভাষার সংখ্যা বৃষ্টির সময় অদৃশ্য ভাষার জন্য একটি মডেলের শুরু শিক্ষার প্রভাব ফেলে দেয়। এই বিভ্রান্তি পূর্ণ করতে আমরা নিম্নলিখিত গবেষণা প্রশ্ন জিজ্ঞেস করছি: (১) গোপন লক্ষ্য ভাষায় ভাষার ভাষার প্রভাব কিভাবে গুলি কর (2) এই প্রশ্নের উত্তর কি মডেল অ্যাডাপ্টেশনের সাথে পরিবর্তন করে? (৩) আমাদের প্রথম প্রশ্নের ফলাফল কি পরিবর্তন করবে যদি ভাষা বৃষ্টির জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয় তাহলে সমস্ত সংশ্লিষ্ট? সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষায় ভাষা পান করার পরীক্ষা নির্দেশ করছে যে বিভিন্ন ভাষা বেছে নেওয়া গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। মডেলের আড্ডাপেশন ছাড়া বিস্ময়কর ভাষার সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধির ফলে সংশ্লিষ্ট ভাষার সাথে যোগ করার জন্য ভাল ফলাফল প্রদান করে।', 'cs': 'Předtrénované vícejazyčné modely umožňují bezproblémové učení i u neviditelných jazyků a tento výkon lze dále zlepšit pomocí adaptace před jemným laděním. Nicméně není jasné, jak počet jazyků předškolení ovlivňuje nulové učení modelu pro jazyky neviděné během předškolení. Abychom tuto mezeru vyplnili, klademe následující výzkumné otázky: (1) Jak počet předškolených jazyků ovlivňuje nulový výkon na neviditelných cílových jazycích? (2) Mění se odpověď na tuto otázku s adaptací modelu? (3) Změní se zjištění naší první otázky, pokud jsou jazyky používané pro předškolení související? Naše experimenty na předškolení s příbuznými jazyky ukazují, že výběr různorodé sady jazyků je klíčový. Bez adaptace modelu překvapivě zvýšení počtu předtrénovacích jazyků přináší lepší výsledky až po přidání souvisejících jazyků, po kterých výkonnostní plošiny.', 'et': 'Eelkoolitatud mitmekeelsed mudelid võimaldavad null-shot õppimist isegi nähtamatute keelte puhul ja seda jõudlust saab veelgi parandada kohandamise teel enne peenhäälestust. Siiski on ebaselge, kuidas eelõpetamise keelte arv mõjutab mudeli nullkäigulist õppimist keelte puhul, mida eelõpetamise ajal ei ole nähtud. Selle lünga täitmiseks esitame järgmised uurimisküsimused: (1) Kuidas mõjutab hariduseelsete keelte arv null-shot jõudlust nähtamatute sihtkeelte puhul? (2) Kas vastus sellele küsimusele muutub mudeli kohandamisega? (3) Kas meie esimese küsimuse tulemused muutuvad, kui eelõpetamisel kasutatavad keeled on kõik seotud? Meie eksperimendid seotud keeltega eelõpetamisel näitavad, et erinevate keelte valimine on otsustava tähtsusega. Ilma mudeli kohandamiseta annab eelõpetamiskeelte arvu suurendamine üllatavalt paremaid tulemusi kuni seotud keelte lisamiseni, mille järel jõudlusplatoodid.', 'ca': "Models multilingües pré-entrenats permeten aprendre amb fotografies zero fins i tot per a llengües invisibles, i aquest rendiment es pot millorar més a través de l'adaptació abans d'ajustar. No obstant això, no és clar com el nombre de llengües de pré-entrenament influeix en l'aprenentatge zero d'un model per les llengües que no es veuen durant la pré-entrenament. Per omplir aquest buit, fem les següents preguntes de recerca: (1) Com influeix el nombre de llengües de pré-formació en el desenvolupament de zero en llengües d'objectiu invisibles? (2) La resposta a aquesta pregunta canvia amb l'adaptació al model? (3) Cambeixen els descobriments de la nostra primera pregunta si les llengües utilitzades per a pré-treinar estan relacionades? Els nostres experiments en pré-treinar amb llengües relacionades indican que triar un conjunt de llengües divers és crucial. Sense l'adaptació del model, sorprenentment, augmentar el nombre de llengües de pré-formació produeix millors resultats fins a afegir llengües relacionades, després d'això plaques de rendiment.", 'bs': 'Preklinjeni multijezički modeli omogućavaju učenje nula snimka čak i za nepoznate jezike, i da se učenje može bolje poboljšati putem adaptacije prije završetka. Međutim, nije jasno kako broj jezika pretkivanja utječe na učenje model a nula pucnjava za jezike koje nisu vidjele tijekom pretkivanja. Za ispunjavanje ovog praznina, postavljamo sljedeća istraživačka pitanja: (1) Kako broj jezika pretvaranja utječe na izvođenje nule pucnjave na nevidljive ciljne jezike? (2) Da li se odgovor na to pitanje mijenja sa adaptacijom modela? (3) Da li se nalazi za naše prvo pitanje mijenjaju ako su jezici koje se koriste za pretkivanje povezani? Naši eksperimenti o pretresanju sa povezanim jezicima ukazuju na to da je važno izabrati različit niz jezika. Bez modela adaptacije, iznenađujuće, povećanje broja jezika pretkivanja pruža bolji rezultat do dodanja povezanih jezika, nakon kojih je provedba plateau.', 'am': 'የተጠቃሚ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች በቋንቋዎች እንኳ የ0-ፎቶ ትምህርት ማድረግ ያስችላል፣ ይህም ማስታወቂያው ከመጠቀም በፊት በማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን በዝናብ ጊዜ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች የሞዴል ትምህርት በቋንቋዎች ላይ የ0-shot ትምህርት እንዴት እንደሚያገባብል አይገለጽም፡፡ To fill this gap, we ask the following research questions:  (1) How does the number of pretraining languages influence zero-shot performance on unseen target languages?  (2) በውኑ የዚያን ጥያቄ መልስ በሞዴል አቀማመጥ ይለውጣል? (3) የመጀመሪያው ጠይቃችን የቋንቋዎች ለመፍጠር የሚጠቀሙት ሁሉ ተያያይተዋል? በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ላይ መፍጠር የሞከረን መፈተኛ ልዩ ቋንቋዎችን መምረጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በሞዴል ማቀናቀል ባይኖር፣ በተደነቀቀ፣ በተጨማሪው የቋንቋዎች ቁጥር መጨመር ይሻላል፡፡', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut monikieliset mallit mahdollistavat nolla-shot oppimisen jopa näkymättömillä kielillä, ja suorituskykyä voidaan parantaa edelleen mukautumalla ennen hienosäätöä. On kuitenkin epäselvää, miten esikoulutuskielten määrä vaikuttaa mallin nollashot-oppimiseen kielillä, joita ei esiopetuksen aikana ole nähty. Tämän aukon täyttämiseksi esitämme seuraavat tutkimuskysymykset: (1) Miten esikoulutuskielten määrä vaikuttaa nollalaukauksen suorituskykyyn näkymättömillä kohdekielillä? 2) Muuttuuko vastaus tähän kysymykseen mallin mukauttamisen myötä? (3) Muuttuvatko ensimmäisen kysymyksemme tulokset, jos esikoulutuksessa käytetyt kielet liittyvät toisiinsa? Kokeemme esikoulutuksesta sukulaisten kielten kanssa osoittavat, että erilaisten kielten valinta on ratkaisevan tärkeää. Ilman mallien mukauttamista esikoulutuskielten määrän lisääminen tuottaa yllättävän paljon parempia tuloksia, minkä jälkeen suorituskyky tasaantuu.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging, kuwi ora ngerasah piye isan langgambar nggawe layang kuwi nggawe gerakan tarjamah 0 politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness (2) Apa mbubati kanggo cejang kuwi turuné karo pas model? (3) Mbok mbukak kebuturan barêng-barêng sing tek gawe ngubah tindang nggawe gerakan karo paké, ora ? Awakdhéwé éntuk nggawe aturan karo akeh luwih anyar tentang ngono nggawe sistem sing apik tur angka sing dikarolan. lah, njuk ngomong sampeyan model, maneh, njaluk akeh langkung banjur luwih apik dadi supoyo supoyo langkung sampeyan luwih apik, soalé mpungan prampet.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, bã ya kasancẽwa da yawan harshen bakwai na yi amfani da sanar da misalin wani sifri wa'asalin da ba'a sani ba a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi. Dõmin cika wannan gaura, Munã tambaya tambayar fitina masu jẽre: (1) Yãya ne ƙidãyar lugha da ake yi wa muhimmin aiki na sifiri kan lugha wanda ba'a sani ba? (2) Shin jibar wannan tambayi ne ya musanya da shirin ayuka? (3) Shin an canza musamman wa tambayar farko idan zimanmu da aka yi amfani da wa baka-baka ko duk sunã da amfani da? TajararinMu da za'a danganta da harshe masu da husũma, yana madaidaita cewa zãɓi wasu harsunan dabam'a ne muhimu. Haƙĩƙa, bã da shirin ayuka ba, yana da mãmãki, da ƙarancin ƙidãyar harshen na garwaya, za'a fitar da mafi alhẽri zuwa a ƙara harshen masu husũma, daban da za'a sami plateaus.", 'sk': 'Predvadljeni večjezični modeli omogočajo učenje brez posnetkov tudi pri nevidnih jezikih, zmogljivost pa se lahko še izboljša s prilagoditvijo pred natančnim nastavitvijo. Vendar pa ni jasno, kako število jezikov, ki se učijo pred usposabljanjem, vpliva na ničelno učenje modela za jezike, ki jih ni bilo mogoče opaziti med predusposabljanjem. Za zapolnitev te vrzeli postavljamo naslednja raziskovalna vprašanja: (1) Kako število jezikov pred usposabljanjem vpliva na zmogljivost brez strela pri nevidnih ciljnih jezikih? (2) Ali se odgovor na to vprašanje spremeni s prilagoditvijo modela? (3) Ali se ugotovitve prvega vprašanja spremenijo, če so jeziki, ki se uporabljajo za predusposabljanje, povezani? Naši poskusi predurjenja s sorodnimi jeziki kažejo, da je izbira različnih jezikov ključnega pomena. Brez prilagoditve modela presenetljivo povečanje števila jezikov pred usposabljanjem prinaša boljše rezultate do dodajanja sorodnih jezikov, po katerem zmogljivost pade.', 'he': 'דוגמנים רבות שפות מתאמנים מראש מאפשרים ללמוד אפס-יריות אפילו לשפות בלתי נראות, והביצועים האלה יכולים להשתפר יותר באמצעות התאמה לפני התאים. עם זאת, לא ברור איך מספר שפות מתקדמות שימוש משפיע על לימוד אפס של מודל לשפות בלתי נראות בזמן התקדמות שימוש. כדי למלא את הפער הזה, אנו שואלים את שאלות המחקר הבאות: (1) איך מספר השפות המתאימות משפיעים על ביצועים של אפס יריות על שפות המטרה בלתי נראות? (2) האם התשובה לשאלה הזאת משתנה עם התאמה מודל? (3) האם הממצאים של השאלה הראשונה שלנו משתנים אם השפות המשתמשות במאמן מראש כולן קשורות? הניסויים שלנו על אימון מראש עם שפות קשורות מצביעים שבחירת קבוצת שפות מגוונת היא קריטית. ללא התאמה דוגמנית, באופן מפתיע, הגבירה במספר שפות מתקדמות מאימון מובילה תוצאות טובות יותר עד להוסיף שפות קשורות, לאחר מכן תוצאות ביצועים.', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་གཅིག་གཡིས་ཀློག་ནི་སྣང་མེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཡང་ན་ མ་ཤེས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཉར་ར ཡིན་ནའང་། ཕབ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་ཀ་གིས་མི་ཤེས་པ་ཅིག་གནོད་ཟེར་ན། To fill this gap, we ask the following research questions: (1) How does the number of pretraining languages affect zero-shot performance on unseen target languages? (2) འདྲི་ཚིག་གི་མཐུན་སྣང་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན་ནམ། (3) ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་པོ་དེ་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་རྣམས་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན་ན་ང་ཚོའི་རྗེས་སུ་ཐོབ་པ་ཅིན་ཏེ། ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་འདེམས་པར་གལ་ཆེན་རེད། མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་མེད་པར་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་ཀ་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་དུ་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཚོར་མཐུན་'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'يتعلم التقليم المنظم النماذج المدمجة والدقيقة', 'es': 'La poda estructurada aprende modelos compactos y precisos', 'fr': "L'élagage structuré permet d'apprendre des modèles compacts et précis", 'pt': 'A poda estruturada aprende modelos compactos e precisos', 'ja': '構造化された枝刈り学習コンパクトで正確なモデル', 'zh': '结构化剪学凑正', 'hi': 'संरचित छंटाई कॉम्पैक्ट और सटीक मॉडल सीखता है', 'ru': 'Структурированная обрезка обучается компактным и точным моделям', 'ga': 'Foghlaimíonn Bearradh Struchtúrtha Múnlaí Dlúth agus Cruinn', 'el': 'Το δομημένο κλάδεμα μαθαίνει συμπαγή και ακριβή μοντέλα', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A strukturált metszés kompakt és pontos modelleket tanul', 'it': 'La potatura strutturata impara modelli compatti e accurati', 'lt': 'Struktūriniai mokymosi būdai: kompaktiniai ir tikslūs modeliai', 'mk': 'Структурирани научи компактни и точни модели', 'kk': 'Құрастырылған көшірмелеу сәйкес мен дұрыс үлгілерді үйренеді', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli kompatti u preċiżi ta’ tagħlim strutturat ta’ tqabbid', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d കോമ്പ്യൂട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതും അക്കുററ്റ് മോഡലുകളുമാണ്', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүний төвөгтэй болон зөв загваруудыг суралцдаг.', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Prunarea structurată învață modele compacte și precise', 'pl': 'Przycinanie strukturalne uczy się kompaktowych i dokładnych modeli', 'sr': 'Strukturirani pruning nauči kompakt i precizni modeli', 'sv': 'Strukturerad beskärning lär sig kompakta och exakta modeller', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Structured Learns Compact and Accurate Models', 'ta': 'கட்டமைக்கப்பட்ட படிப்புகள் தொடர்பு மற்றும் கணக்கீடு மாதிரிகள்', 'ur': 'Structured Pruning Learns Compact and Accurate Models', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học hành mận Có cấu trúc Mẫu công cộng và chính xác', 'hr': 'Strukturirani pruning nauči kompaktni i precizni modeli', 'de': 'Strukturierter Schnitt lernt kompakte und präzise Modelle', 'da': 'Struktureret beskæring lærer kompakte og nøjagtige modeller', 'bg': 'Структурното подрязване учи компактни и точни модели', 'nl': 'Gestructureerd snoeien leert compacte en nauwkeurige modellen', 'ko': '구조화 가지치기 학습의 치밀하고 정확한 모형', 'id': 'Model Kompak dan Tepat Pelajaran Terstruktur', 'fa': 'قالب ساخته\u200cشده مدل\u200cهای پیچیده و دقیق یاد می\u200cگیرد', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Kuhusiana na Hesabu', 'tr': 'Structured Pruning Learns Compact and Accurate Models', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Modele të strukturuara të mësimeve të sakta dhe kompakte', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Կառուցված ուսումնասիրությունները համեմատ և ճշգրիտ մոդելներ', 'az': 'YapńĪlmńĪŇü Pruning Kompakt v…ô Tam Modell…ôri √∂yr…ônir', 'bn': 'নির্মাণ করা শিক্ষা যোগাযোগ এবং অ্যাকারাট মোডেল', 'bs': 'Strukturirani pruning nauči kompakt i precizni modeli', 'ca': "Models estructurats d'aprenentatge prudent compactes i exacts", 'cs': 'Strukturované řezání se naučí kompaktní a přesné modely', 'et': 'Struktureeritud oksamine õpib kompaktseid ja täpseid mudeleid', 'fi': 'Strukturoitu leikkaus oppii kompaktit ja tarkat mallit', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'structural Prouning Learns Compct and Akurate model', 'he': 'מודלים חדים ודוקסים', 'sk': 'Strukturirano obrezovanje uči kompaktne in natančne modele', 'bo': 'Structured Pruning Learns Compact and Accurate Models'}
{'en': 'Generic summaries try to cover an entire document and query-based summaries try to answer document-specific questions. But real users’ needs often fall in between these extremes and correspond to aspects, high-level topics discussed among similar types of documents. In this paper, we collect a dataset of realistic aspect-oriented summaries, AspectNews, which covers different subtopics about articles in news sub-domains. We annotate data across two domains of articles, earthquakes and fraud investigations, where each article is annotated with two distinct summaries focusing on different aspects for each domain. A system producing a single generic summary cannot concisely satisfy both aspects. Our focus in evaluation is how well existing techniques can generalize to these domains without seeing in-domain training data, so we turn to techniques to construct synthetic training data that have been used in query-focused summarization work. We compare several training schemes that differ in how strongly keywords are used and how oracle summaries are extracted. Our evaluation shows that our final approach yields (a) focused summaries, better than those from a generic summarization system or from keyword matching; (b) a system sensitive to the choice of keywords.', 'ar': 'أدى الحجم المتزايد لنماذج اللغة العصبية إلى زيادة الاهتمام بضغط النموذج. الأسلوبان السائدان هما التقليم ، والذي يزيل تدريجياً الأوزان من نموذج مدرب مسبقًا ، والتقطير ، الذي يقوم بتدريب نموذج مضغوط أصغر لمطابقة نموذج أكبر. يمكن أن تقلل طرق التقليم بشكل كبير من حجم النموذج ولكنها بالكاد تحقق تسريعًا كبيرًا مثل التقطير. ومع ذلك ، تتطلب طرق التقطير كميات كبيرة من البيانات غير المسماة وتدريبها غالي الثمن. في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة تشذيب منظمة خاصة بالمهمة CoFi (تقليم خشن ودقيق الحبيبات) ، والتي توفر شبكات فرعية قابلة للتوازي بدرجة عالية وتتطابق مع طرق التقطير في كل من الدقة والكمون ، دون اللجوء إلى أي بيانات غير مسماة. تتمثل رؤيتنا الرئيسية في التقليم المشترك للوحدات ذات الحبيبات الخشنة (على سبيل المثال ، الطبقات) والحبيبات الدقيقة (على سبيل المثال ، الرؤوس والوحدات المخفية) ، والتي تتحكم في قرار التقليم لكل معلمة بأقنعة ذات تفاصيل مختلفة. نحن نبتكر أيضًا إستراتيجية تقطير ذات طبقات لنقل المعرفة من النماذج غير المعدلة إلى النماذج المشذبة أثناء التحسين. تُظهر تجاربنا على مجموعات البيانات GLUE و SQuAD أن CoFi تنتج نماذج مع تسريع أكثر من 10 مرات مع انخفاض بسيط في الدقة ، مما يدل على فعاليتها وكفاءتها مقارنة بأساليب التقليم والتقطير السابقة.', 'es': 'El creciente tamaño de los modelos de lenguaje neuronal ha llevado a una mayor atención en la compresión de modelos. Los dos enfoques predominantes son la poda, que elimina gradualmente los pesos de un modelo previamente entrenado, y la destilación, que entrena un modelo compacto más pequeño para que coincida con uno más grande. Los métodos de poda pueden reducir significativamente el tamaño del modelo, pero apenas logran grandes aceleraciones como la destilación. Sin embargo, los métodos de destilación requieren grandes cantidades de datos no etiquetados y son costosos de entrenar. En este trabajo, proponemos un método de poda estructurado específico para la tarea CoFi (poda de grano grueso y fino), que ofrece subredes altamente paralelizables y coincide con los métodos de destilación tanto en precisión como en latencia, sin recurrir a ningún dato no etiquetado. Nuestra visión clave es podar conjuntamente módulos de grano grueso (por ejemplo, capas) y de grano fino (por ejemplo, cabezas y unidades ocultas), que controlan la decisión de poda de cada parámetro con máscaras de diferente granularidad. También diseñamos una estrategia de destilación por capas para transferir el conocimiento de los modelos sin podar a los podados durante la optimización. Nuestros experimentos en los conjuntos de datos GLUE y sQuad muestran que CoFi produce modelos con aceleraciones de más de 10 veces con una pequeña caída de precisión, lo que demuestra su eficacia y eficiencia en comparación con los enfoques anteriores de poda y destilación.', 'fr': "La taille croissante des modèles de langage neuronal a entraîné une attention accrue dans la compression des modèles. Les deux approches prédominantes sont l'élagage, qui élimine progressivement les poids d'un modèle préentraîné, et la distillation, qui entraîne un modèle compact plus petit pour qu'il corresponde à un modèle plus grand. Les méthodes d'élagage peuvent réduire considérablement la taille du modèle mais ne permettent guère d'atteindre des accélérations importantes comme la distillation. Cependant, les méthodes de distillation nécessitent de grandes quantités de données non étiquetées et sont coûteuses à entraîner. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une méthode d'élagage structuré spécifique à la tâche CoFi (Élagage grossier et fin), qui fournit des sous-réseaux hautement parallélisables et correspond aux méthodes de distillation en termes de précision et de latence, sans avoir recours à des données non étiquetées. Notre objectif principal est de tailler conjointement des modules à grains grossiers (par exemple, couches) et à grains fins (par exemple, têtes et unités cachées), qui contrôlent la décision d'élagage de chaque paramètre avec des masques de granularité différente. Nous concevons également une stratégie de distillation par couches pour transférer les connaissances des modèles non taillés aux modèles taillés pendant l'optimisation. Nos expériences sur les ensembles de données GLUE et SQuad montrent que le CoFi produit des modèles avec des accélérations plus de 10 fois avec une faible baisse de précision, montrant ainsi son efficacité et son efficience par rapport aux approches précédentes d'élagage et de distillation.", 'pt': 'O tamanho crescente dos modelos de linguagem neural levou a uma maior atenção na compressão do modelo. As duas abordagens predominantes são a poda, que remove gradualmente os pesos de um modelo pré-treinado, e a destilação, que treina um modelo compacto menor para combinar com um modelo maior. Os métodos de poda podem reduzir significativamente o tamanho do modelo, mas dificilmente atingem grandes acelerações como a destilação. No entanto, os métodos de destilação exigem grandes quantidades de dados não rotulados e são caros para treinar. Neste trabalho, propomos um método de poda estruturada específica de tarefa CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-grained Pruning), que fornece sub-redes altamente paralelizáveis e combina os métodos de destilação em precisão e latência, sem recorrer a dados não rotulados. Nosso principal insight é podar conjuntamente os módulos de granulação grossa (por exemplo, camadas) e de granulação fina (por exemplo, cabeças e unidades ocultas), que controla a decisão de poda de cada parâmetro com máscaras de granularidade diferente. Também desenvolvemos uma estratégia de destilação em camadas para transferir conhecimento de modelos não podados para modelos podados durante a otimização. Nossos experimentos em conjuntos de dados GLUE e SQuAD mostram que o CoFi produz modelos com mais de 10 vezes a velocidade com uma pequena queda de precisão, mostrando sua eficácia e eficiência em comparação com abordagens anteriores de poda e destilação.', 'ja': '神経言語モデルの規模の拡大は、モデル圧縮の注目度を高めることにつながった。 2つの主なアプローチは、事前に訓練されたモデルから徐々に重みを取り除く枝刈りと、より小さなコンパクトモデルをより大きなモデルに合わせて訓練する蒸留です。 剪定方法は、モデルサイズを大幅に削減することができますが、蒸留などの大規模なスピードアップはほとんど達成できません。 しかしながら、蒸留法は大量のラベル付けされていないデータを必要とし、訓練には高価である。 本研究では、タスク固有の構造化枝刈り法CoFi （粗粒枝刈りと細粒枝刈り）を提案し、ラベル付けされていないデータを使用せずに、非常に並列化可能なサブネットワークを提供し、精度と遅延の両方で蒸留方法を一致させます。 私たちの重要な洞察は、粗粒（例えば、層）と細粒（例えば、頭部と隠しユニット）モジュールを共同で剪定することです。これは、異なる粒度のマスクで各パラメータの剪定決定を制御します。 また、最適化中に枝刈りされていないモデルから枝刈りされたモデルに知識を転送するための層別蒸留戦略も考案しています。 グルーとSQuADデータセットの実験では、CoFiは、従来の枝刈りおよび蒸留アプローチと比較して、その有効性と効率性を示す、小さな精度低下で10倍以上のスピードアップのモデルを生み出すことが示されています。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल के बढ़ते आकार ने मॉडल संपीड़न में ध्यान में वृद्धि की है। दो प्रमुख दृष्टिकोण छंटाई कर रहे हैं, जो धीरे-धीरे एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल से वजन को हटा देता है, और आसवन, जो एक छोटे कॉम्पैक्ट मॉडल को एक बड़े से मेल खाने के लिए प्रशिक्षित करता है। छंटाई विधियां मॉडल आकार को काफी कम कर सकती हैं लेकिन आसवन के रूप में शायद ही बड़े स्पीडअप प्राप्त करती हैं। हालांकि, आसवन विधियों को बड़ी मात्रा में बिना लेबल वाले डेटा की आवश्यकता होती है और प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए महंगे होते हैं। इस काम में, हम एक कार्य-विशिष्ट संरचित छंटाई विधि CoFi (मोटे- और ठीक दानेदार Pruning) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो अत्यधिक समानांतर उपनेटवर्क प्रदान करता है और किसी भी लेबल रहित डेटा का सहारा लिए बिना सटीकता और विलंबता दोनों में आसवन विधियों से मेल खाता है। हमारी प्रमुख अंतर्दृष्टि संयुक्त रूप से मोटे-दाने (जैसे, परतों) और ठीक-दाने वाले (जैसे, सिर और छिपी हुई इकाइयों) मॉड्यूल की छंटाई करना है, जो विभिन्न ग्रैन्युलैरिटी के मुखौटे के साथ प्रत्येक पैरामीटर के छंटाई निर्णय को नियंत्रित करता है। हम अनुकूलन के दौरान अनप्रून्ड से छंटाई किए गए मॉडल में ज्ञान को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए एक परतवार आसवन रणनीति भी तैयार करते हैं। GLUE और SQuAD डेटासेट पर हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि CoFi एक छोटी सटीकता ड्रॉप के साथ 10X से अधिक स्पीडअप के साथ मॉडल उत्पन्न करता है, जो पिछले छंटाई और आसवन दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में इसकी प्रभावशीलता और दक्षता दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'Растущий размер нейронных языковых моделей привел к повышению внимания к сжатию моделей. Двумя преобладающими подходами являются обрезка, которая постепенно удаляет грузы из предварительно обученной модели, и дистилляция, которая тренирует меньшую компактную модель, чтобы соответствовать большей. Методы обрезки могут значительно уменьшить размер модели, но вряд ли достигают больших ускорений в виде дистилляции. Однако методы дистилляции требуют больших объемов немаркированных данных и являются дорогостоящими для обучения. В этой работе мы предлагаем специфичный для задачи структурированный метод обрезки CoFi (грубо- и мелкозернистая обрезка), который обеспечивает высокопараллельные подсети и соответствует методам дистилляции как по точности, так и по запаздыванию, не прибегая к каким-либо немеченным данным. Наша основная идея заключается в совместной обрезке крупнозернистых (например, слоев) и мелкозернистых (например, головок и скрытых единиц) модулей, которые управляют решением обрезки каждого параметра с помощью масок различной детализации. Мы также разрабатываем стратегию послойной дистилляции для передачи знаний от необработанных к обрезанным моделям во время оптимизации. Наши эксперименты с наборами данных по КЛЕЮ и SQuAD показывают, что CoFi производит модели с более чем 10-КРАТНЫМ ускорением с небольшим падением точности, демонстрируя свою эффективность и результативность по сравнению с предыдущими подходами к обрезке и дистилляции.', 'zh': '神经语言模形愈大,而人对模型压缩注日增。 二要者,剪之也,渐除权重,及蒸馏,小者凑之,以配大者也。 剪法显减尺寸,而难成蒸馏者大幅速。 然蒸馏法须多未标之数,且练成本高昂。 凡此等事,特定结构化剪法CoFi(粗粒度与细粒度剪),供高并化之子网,配以准确性迟蒸馏,无诉诸未标之数。 凡我大体,共剪粗粒度(,重)细粒度(,头隐单元)模块,模块用异粒度掩码制参数剪。 设蒸馏策,移优化未剪。 吾于 GLUE 、 SQuAD 数集上之实验,CoFi 生倍 10 ,精降甚小,比之前修蒸馏法,显其有效性效率。', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar mhéid mhéadaithe na múnlaí teanga néaracha tá aird mhéadaithe i gcomhbhrú samhlacha. Is iad bearradh an dá chur chuige is mó, a bhaineann de réir a chéile meáchain ó mhúnla réamh-oilte, agus driogadh, a thraenálann múnla dlúth níos lú chun múnla níos mó a mheaitseáil. Is féidir le modhanna bearradh méid an mhúnla a laghdú go suntasach ach is ar éigean a bhaintear amach luasanna móra mar dhriogadh. Mar sin féin, éilíonn modhanna driogtha go leor sonraí neamhlipéadaithe agus tá siad costasach le hoiliúint. San obair seo, molaimid modh bearrtha struchtúrtha tasc-shonrach CoFi (Pruning Garbh agus Mínghráin), a sheachadann fo-líonraí an-chomhthreomhar agus a mheaitseálann na modhanna driogtha ó thaobh cruinneas agus folaigh de, gan dul i muinín aon sonraí gan lipéad. Is é an príomhléargas atá againn ná modúil gharbhghráin (m.sh., sraitheanna) agus mínghráinneach (m.sh. cinn agus aonaid i bhfolach) a ghearradh i gcomhpháirt, a rialaíonn cinneadh bearradh gach paraiméadar le maisc de ghráinneacht éagsúla. Ceapaimid freisin straitéis driogtha ciseal-chiseal chun eolas a aistriú ó mhúnlaí neamhbhearrtha go samhlacha bearrtha le linn barrfheabhsú. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh ar thacair sonraí GLUE agus SQuAD go dtugann CoFi samhlacha le breis agus 10X luasmhéadair le laghdú beag cruinnis, rud a léiríonn a éifeachtacht agus a éifeachtúlacht i gcomparáid le cur chuige bearradh agus driogtha roimhe seo.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ენის მოდელების ზომა უფრო დიდება მოდელური კომპრესიაში დაახლოებით. ორი სამუშაო წარმოდგენება უფრო კომპექტური მოდელიდან, რომელიც წარმოდგენა უფრო კომპექტური მოდელიდან, და დისტლილაციაზე, რომელიც უფრო დიდ მოდელის მოდელის გარშემოდგ მოდელური ზომა შეიძლება მნიშვნელოვანად გადასრულება, მაგრამ არაფერად დიდი სიჩქარე გადასრულება. მაგრამ განსხვავებული მეტოვები უნდა დიდი რაოდენობა არაწერებული მონაცემების და უკეთესი განსხვავება. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდომებით სამუშაო სტრუქტურაციული პრონცირების მეთოდი CoFi, რომელიც ძალიან პარალელიზაციური სამუშაო ქსელების შესაძლებლობა და განსხვავებული სტრუქტურაციის მეთოდის ორივე სიმართლეში და სამუ ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები არის ერთადერთად გადაწყალოთ მოდულები, რომელიც ყველა პარამეტრის გადაწყალება განსხვავებული გრანულაციის მასკებით. ჩვენ ასევე დავიწყებთ სტრატიკაციის სტრატიფიკაციის სტრატიფიკაცია, რომელიც ცნობიერების გადატვირთვა არ გავაკეთებული მოდელებისთვის. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები GLUE და SQuAD მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გამოჩვენება, რომ CoFi მოდელები 10 X-ზე მეტი სიჩქარე, რომლებიც ცოტა წარმოადგენა, რომლებიც მისი ეფექტიურობა და ეფექტიურობა ჩვენებ', 'el': 'Το αυξανόμενο μέγεθος των μοντέλων νευρωνικής γλώσσας έχει οδηγήσει σε αυξημένη προσοχή στη συμπίεση μοντέλων. Οι δύο κυρίαρχες προσεγγίσεις είναι το κλάδεμα, το οποίο σταδιακά αφαιρεί τα βάρη από ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο, και η απόσταξη, η οποία εκπαιδεύει ένα μικρότερο συμπαγές μοντέλο για να ταιριάζει με ένα μεγαλύτερο. Οι μέθοδοι κλαδέματος μπορούν να μειώσουν σημαντικά το μέγεθος του μοντέλου αλλά ελάχιστα να επιτύχουν μεγάλες ταχύτητες ως απόσταξη. Ωστόσο, οι μέθοδοι απόσταξης απαιτούν μεγάλες ποσότητες δεδομένων χωρίς επισήμανση και είναι ακριβές στην εκπαίδευση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια δομημένη μέθοδο κλαδέματος που παρέχει εξαιρετικά παράλληλα υποδίκτυα και ταιριάζει με τις μεθόδους απόσταξης τόσο σε ακρίβεια όσο και σε καθυστέρηση, χωρίς να καταφεύγει σε δεδομένα χωρίς επισήμανση. Η βασική μας γνώση είναι να κλαδέψουμε από κοινού χονδρόκοκκες (π.χ. στρώματα) και λεπτόκοκκες (π.χ. κεφαλές και κρυφές μονάδες), οι οποίες ελέγχουν την απόφαση κλαδέματος κάθε παραμέτρου με μάσκες διαφορετικής κοκκοπότητας. Σχεδιάζουμε επίσης μια στρατηγική απόσταξης κατά τη διάρκεια της βελτιστοποίησης. Τα πειράματά μας σε σύνολα δεδομένων GLUE και SQuAD δείχνουν ότι το παράγει μοντέλα με πάνω από 10x ταχύτητες με μικρή πτώση ακρίβειας, δείχνοντας την αποτελεσματικότητά του και την αποτελεσματικότητά του σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις κλαδέματος και απόσταξης.', 'hu': 'A neurális nyelvi modellek növekvő mérete miatt fokozott figyelmet fordított a modelltömörítésben. A két fő megközelítés a metszés, amely fokozatosan eltávolítja a súlyokat egy előkészített modellből, és a desztilláció, amely egy kisebb kompakt modellt képez, hogy illeszkedjen egy nagyobb modellhez. A metszési módszerek jelentősen csökkenthetik a modell méretét, de nem érhetnek el nagy felgyorsulást desztillációként. A lepárlási módszerek azonban nagy mennyiségű címke nélküli adatot igényelnek, és költségesek a képzés. Ebben a munkában feladatspecifikus strukturált metszési módszert javasolunk CoFi (durva- és finomszemű metszés), amely rendkívül párhuzamos alhálózatokat biztosít, és pontosságban és késleltetésben egyaránt illeszkedik a desztillációs módszerekhez, címke nélküli adatok igénybevétele nélkül. Kulcsfontosságú betekintésünk a durva szemű (pl. rétegek) és finom szemű (pl. fejek és rejtett egységek) modulok együttes metszése, amelyek minden paraméter metszési döntését különböző szemcsésségű maszkokkal szabályozzák. Ezenkívül kidolgozunk egy réteges desztillációs stratégiát is, amely az optimalizálás során a tudás átadására a nem futtatott modellekről a metszett modellekre. A GLUE és SQUAD adatkészletekkel végzett kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a CoFi kisebb pontossági csökkenéssel több mint 10-szeres gyorsulással képes modelleket eredményez, amelyek hatékonyságát és hatékonyságát mutatják a korábbi metszési és desztillációs megközelítésekhez képest.', 'it': "La crescente dimensione dei modelli di linguaggio neurale ha portato ad una maggiore attenzione nella compressione dei modelli. I due approcci predominanti sono la potatura, che rimuove gradualmente i pesi da un modello pre-addestrato, e la distillazione, che allena un modello compatto più piccolo per abbinare uno più grande. I metodi di potatura possono ridurre significativamente le dimensioni del modello, ma difficilmente ottenere grandi accelerazioni come distillazione. Tuttavia, i metodi di distillazione richiedono grandi quantità di dati non etichettati e sono costosi da addestrare. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un metodo di potatura strutturato specifico per attività CoFi (Grorse- and Fine-grained Pruning), che fornisce sottoreti altamente parallele e si adatta ai metodi di distillazione sia in accuratezza che latenza, senza ricorrere a dati non etichettati. La nostra intuizione chiave è quella di potare congiuntamente moduli a grana grossa (ad esempio strati) e a grana fine (ad esempio teste e unità nascoste), che controllano la decisione di potatura di ogni parametro con maschere di granularità diversa. Elaboriamo anche una strategia di distillazione stratificata per trasferire le conoscenze da modelli non lavorati a modelli potati durante l'ottimizzazione. I nostri esperimenti sui dataset GLUE e SQUAD mostrano che CoFi produce modelli con velocità superiori a 10 volte con un piccolo calo di precisione, mostrando la sua efficacia ed efficienza rispetto ai precedenti approcci di potatura e distillazione.", 'kk': 'Невралдық тіл үлгілерінің өлшемі үлгілікті компрессиялау үлгісінде болатын болды. Екі бастапқы жағдайдың көтерілігі көтерілген, бұл көтерілген үлгіні алдын- ала оқылған үлгінен және дистриляцияны өшіру үшін кішкентай компьютер үлгісін көтерілген. Көрсету әдістері үлгі өлшемін көбейту мүмкін, бірақ бұл үлкен жылдамдықтарды дисплейлеу ретінде жеткізе алады. Бірақ дистриляциялау әдістері үлкен мәліметтерді талап етеді және оқыту үшін үлкен мәліметтер керек. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз тапсырманың құрастыру әдісін CoFi (Көпшілік және Қайырлық және Қайырлық Прунинг) ұсынамыз. Бұл көп параллелизациялық ішкі желілерді жеткізеді, бірақ дұрыс және кеңістік деңгейіндегі деңгей Біздің кілттеріміз біріктірілген (мысалы, қабаттар) және жасырылған (мысалы, толық және жасырылған бірліктер) модульдерді біріктіру үшін, бұл параметрлердің түрлі гранулациялық қалқалармен шешімін бақылады. Мұндай-ақ білімдерді оптимизациялау кезінде жұмыс істемеген моделдерге аудару үшін қабаттың дистилациялау стратегиясын құрамыз. GLUE және SQuAD деректер қорларындағы тәжірибелеріміз, CoFi 10-ден артық жылдамдықтығымен шағын деңгейінгі деңгейіндегі үлгілерді көрсетеді, алдыңғы тәжірибелеу және дистриляциялау жағдайларына салыст', 'lt': 'Didėjantis nervinių kalbų modelių dydis padidino modelio spaudimą. Dvi vyraujantys metodai yra smulkinimas, kuris laipsniškai pašalina svorius iš iš iš anksto apmokyto modelio, ir distiliavimas, kuris sukuria mažesnį kompaktų model į, atitinkantį didesnį modelį. Išplaukimo metodai gali gerokai sumažinti modelio dydį, tačiau distiliavimo būdu beveik nepasiekia didelių greičių. Tačiau distiliavimo metodams reikalingas didelis kiekis nepažymėtų duomenų ir jie brangūs mokymui. Šiame darbe siūlome konkrečiai užduotims būdingą struktūrizuotą skaldymo metodą CoFi (angl. Coarse- and Fine-grained Pruning), kuris teikia labai paralelizuojamus posistemius ir atitinka distiliavimo metodus tiek tikslumu, tiek latentumu, nenaudojant jokių nenurodytų duomenų. Mūsų pagrindinis supratimas yra bendrai susmulkinti didžiųjų grūdų (pvz., sluoksnius) ir smulkiųjų grūdų (pvz., galvas ir paslėptus vienetus) modulius, kurie kontroliuoja kiekvieno parametro nusprendimą susmulkinti skirtingo granuliarumo kaukomis. Taip pat parengiame sluoksnių distiliavimo strategiją, kad optimizavimo metu žinios būtų perduotos iš neperdirbtų modelių į neperdirbtus modelius. Mūsų eksperimentai su GLUE ir SQuAD duomenų rinkiniais rodo, kad CoFi gamina modelius, kurių greitis didesnis kaip 10 kartų mažesnis ir kurių tikslumas nedidelis, ir tai rodo jo veiksmingumą ir veiksmingumą, palyginti su ankstesniais skaldymo ir distiliavimo metodais.', 'mk': 'Растечката големина на моделите на нервниот јазик доведе до зголемено внимание во моделот на компресија. Двајцата претежни пристапи се кревање, што постепено ги отстранува тежините од предобучен модел, и дистилација, која обучува помал компактен модел за да се совпаѓа со поголем. Методите за притиснување можат значително да ја намалат големината на моделот, но едвај постигнуваат големи брзини како дистилација. Сепак, методите на дистилација бараат големи количини необележани податоци и се скапи за обука. Во оваа работа, предложуваме структуриран метод за прскање кофи за задачи (Coarse- and Fine-grained Pruning), кој обезбедува високо паралелизирани подмрежи и ги совпаѓа методите за дистилација во точност и лантенција, без користење на никакви неозначени податоци. Нашиот клучен поглед е заеднички да ги скриеме модулите со грубо зелено (на пример, слоеви) и фино зелено (на пример, глави и скриени единици), кои ја контролираат одлуката за скривање на секој параметр со маски со различна грануларност. Ние, исто така, подготвуваме стратегија за дестилација во рамка на слоеви за пренесување на знаење од непроменети на скриени модели за време на оптимизацијата. Нашите експерименти на податоците GLUE и SQuAD покажуваат дека CoFi продава модели со над 10X брзини со мал пад на прецизност, покажувајќи ја нејзината ефикасност и ефикасност во споредба со претходните пристапи на исцепување и дестилација.', 'ms': 'Saiz tumbuh model bahasa saraf telah membawa kepada perhatian meningkat dalam pemampatan model. Dua pendekatan yang berkuasa adalah pemotongan, yang secara perlahan-lahan menghapuskan berat dari model yang dilatih dahulu, dan pemotongan, yang melatih model kompat yang lebih kecil untuk sepadan dengan model yang lebih besar. Kaedah pengusiran boleh mengurangi saiz model secara signifikan tetapi hampir tidak mencapai kecepatan besar sebagai pengusiran. Bagaimanapun, kaedah destilasi memerlukan jumlah besar data tidak berlebihan dan mahal untuk dilatih. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan kaedah pemotongan struktur-khusus tugas CoFi (Pemotongan Kubur dan Kubur-Baik), yang menyediakan subrangkaian yang dapat bersamaan dengan tinggi dan sepadan dengan kaedah pemotongan dalam ketepatan dan keterlaluan, tanpa menggunakan mana-mana data tidak berlebihan. Penglihatan kunci kami adalah untuk bersama-sama mencukur modul-benih tebal (contohnya lapisan) dan benih tebal (contohnya kepala dan unit tersembunyi), yang mengawal keputusan mencukur setiap parameter dengan topeng granulariti yang berbeza. Kami juga merancang strategi penapisan secara lapisan untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari model yang tidak dijalankan ke model yang dipotong semasa optimasi. Eksperimen kami pada set data GLUE dan SQuAD menunjukkan bahawa CoFi menghasilkan model dengan lebih 10X speedups dengan titik kecepatan yang kecil, menunjukkan keefektivitasnya dan keefektivitasnya dibandingkan dengan pendekatan pemotongan dan destilasi terdahulu.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ വലിപ്പം മാതൃകയില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. The two predominant approaches are pruning, which gradually removes weights from a pre-trained model, and distillation, which trains a smaller compact model to match a larger one.  പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലിന്റെ വലിപ്പം കുറച്ചു കാണിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, പക്ഷെ വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന എങ്കിലും വേര്\u200dപെടുത്താനുള്ള രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് വലിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. പരിശീലനം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d വിലയുണ്ട്. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ജോലിയുടെ പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുനിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട കോഫി (കോഴ്സ്- കൈക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള പ്രവർത്തനം) രീതിയിലേക്ക് നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അത് ഏറ്റവും അളവി നമ്മുടെ താക്കോല്\u200d കണ്ണുകള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് കോര്\u200dസ് ഗ്രേപ്പ് ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന (ഉദാഹരണത്തിന് തലകളും ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന യൂണിറ്റുകളും) ഘടകങ്ങളും, അത് വ്യത് പരിജ്ഞാനം മാറ്റുന്നതിനു വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സ്വതന്ത്രമായ വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള ഒരു ഗ്ര ഗ്ലൂയിയും സ്കുവാഡ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു കോഫിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d 10X വേഗത്തിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഒരു ചെ', 'mt': 'Id-daqs dejjem jikber tal-mudelli tal-lingwa newrali wassal għal aktar attenzjoni fil-kompressjoni tal-mudell. Iż-żewġ approċċi predominanti huma l-pruning, li gradwalment ineħħi l-piżijiet minn mudell imħarreġ minn qabel, u d-distillazzjoni, li tħarreġ mudell kompatt iżgħar biex jaqbel ma’ mudell akbar. Il-metodi tal-ħasil jistgħu jnaqqsu b’mod sinifikanti d-daqs tal-mudell iżda ftit li xejn jiksbu speedups kbar bħala distillazzjoni. Madankollu, il-metodi ta’ distillazzjoni jeħtieġu ammonti kbar ta’ dejta mingħajr tikketta u jiswew ħafna biex jitħarrġu. F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu metodu ta’ pruning strutturat speċifiku għall-kompiti CoFi (pruning bil-ħbub il-qoxra u l-ħbub fin), li jwassal għal sottonetwerks parallelizzati ħafna u jaqbel mal-metodi ta’ distillazzjoni kemm fil-preċiżjoni kif ukoll fit-latenza, mingħajr ma jirrikorri għal kwalunkwe dejta mingħajr tikketta. L-g ħarfien ewlieni tagħna huwa li nħażnu flimkien il-moduli tal-ħbub grossi (e ż., saffi) u tal-ħbub fin (eż., ir-ras u l-unitajiet moħbija), li jikkontrollaw id-deċiżjoni tal-ħażna ta’ kull parametru b’maskri ta’ granularità differenti. We also devise a layerwise distillation strategy to transfer knowledge from unpruned to pruned models during optimization.  L-esperimenti tagħna fuq settijiet ta’ dejta GLUE u SQuAD juru li CoFi jagħti mudelli b’aktar minn 10X speedups bi tnaqqis żgħir ta’ preċiżjoni, li juri l-effettività u l-effiċjenza tiegħu meta mqabbel ma’ approċċi preċedenti ta’ pruning u distillazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Неврал хэл загварын хэмжээний том хэмжээг загварын даралтын анхаарлыг нэмэгдүүлсэн. Эдгээр хоёр чухал ойлголт нь суурилсан загвараас жингийг бага зэрэг хадгалдаг. Энэ нь илүү том загвартай холбогдохын тулд жижиг хэмжээний загварыг дамжуулдаг. Дараагийн арга нь загварын хэмжээг үнэхээр багасгаж чадна. Гэхдээ маш том хурдыг тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Гэхдээ сайжруулах арга нь маш их хэмжээний мэдээллийг шаарддаг бөгөөд сургуульд үнэтэй. Энэ ажлын тулд бид CoFi (Coarse-and Fine-grain Pruning) бүтээмжтэй бүтээмжтэй пронингийн аргыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь маш параллелизмдэг субсүлжээний сүлжээнд хүргэж, яг зөв болон салан тулгарч байгаагүй өгөгдлийн хувьд тохиромжтой байдаг. Бидний түлхүүр ойлголттой зүйл бол хамтдаа давсан (жишээлбэл, давсан) болон цэвэрхэн давсан (жишээлбэл, толгой, нуугдсан нэгжүүд) модуль холбогдох юм. Энэ нь параметр бүр өөр гранулацийн гадаргуудыг удирддаг. Мөн бид өөрсдийгөө сайжруулах үед мэдлэгийг хэрэггүй загвараас хадгалагдахын тулд загварын сайжруулах стратеги төсөөлж байна. Бидний GLUE болон SQuAD өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд CoFi нь 10X-аас илүү хурдан бага зөвхөн тодорхойлолтой моделуудыг дамжуулж, өмнө дамжуулах болон ялгаруулах аргачлалтай харьцуулсан үр дүнтэй, үр дүнтэй харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Storleiken på neuralspråk-modeller har ført til å auka oppmerksomhet i modellekomprimering. Dei to viktige tilnærmingane er kryptering, som pakkar vekt frå ein først treng modell og distillasjon, som treng ein mindre kompaktmodell for å passa med ein større modell. Utføringsmetoder kan redusere modelstorleiken betydelig, men vanskeleg oppnå store raskaren som destilasjon. Men distillasjonsmetodar krev stor mengdar av ubeabelte data og er kostna for trening. I denne arbeida foreslår vi eit oppgåvespesifikke strukturert pruningsmetode CoFi (krarse- og fine- grained Pruning), som leverer svært paralleliserte undernettverk og passar med destilasjonsmetodane i både nøyaktighet og latens, utan å resortera til nokon ukjend data. Nøkkelinnsyninga vårt er å kopla inn modular med kryssare (f.eks. lag) og finsare (f.eks. kopla og g øymde einingar), som styrer avgjøringa av kvar parameter med masker med ulike granularitet. Vi bestemmer også ein lagdestilasjonsstrategi for å overføra kunnskap frå utløyst til uttrykt modeller under optimalisering. Eksperimentane våre på GLUE og SQuAD-datasett viser at CoFi gjev modeller med over 10X raskaren med ein liten nøyaktig nedtrekking, viser effektiviteten og effektiviteten samanlikna med førre tilnærmingar for prøving og destilasjon.', 'pl': 'Rosnący rozmiar modeli języka neuronowego doprowadził do zwiększenia uwagi w kompresji modeli. Dwa dominujące podejścia to przycinanie, które stopniowo usuwa ciężary z wstępnie trenowanego modelu, oraz destylacja, która szkoli mniejszy kompaktowy model, aby pasował do większego. Metody przycinania mogą znacznie zmniejszyć wielkość modelu, ale trudno osiągnąć duże przyspieszenia jako destylacja. Jednakże metody destylacji wymagają dużych ilości danych nieoznakowanych i są kosztowne w treningu. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy specyficzną dla zadania metodę strukturalnego przycinania CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-Grained Pruning), która zapewnia wysoce równoległe podsieci i dopasowuje metody destylacji zarówno pod względem dokładności, jak i opóźnienia, bez uciekania się do żadnych nieoznakowanych danych. Naszym kluczowym wglądem jest wspólne przycinanie modułów gruboziarnistych (np. warstw) i drobnoziarnistych (np. głowic i ukrytych jednostek), które kontrolują decyzję o przycinaniu każdego parametru za pomocą masek o różnej granularności. Opracowujemy również strategię destylacji warstwowej, aby przenieść wiedzę z nieuprawnionych do przyciętych modeli podczas optymalizacji. Nasze eksperymenty na zbiorach danych GLUE i SQuAD pokazują, że CoFi daje modele o ponad 10-krotnym przyspieszeniu przy małym spadku dokładności, co pokazuje jego skuteczność i wydajność w porównaniu z poprzednimi metodami przycinania i destylacji.', 'sr': 'Povećana veličina neuralnih jezičkih modela dovela je do povećanja pažnje u modelu kompresije. Dva predominantna pristupa su pružanja, koja postupno uklanja težinu iz predobučenog model a i destilacija, koja trenira manji kompaktni model kako bi odgovarala većim. Metode za pružanje mogu značajno smanjiti veličinu modela, ali jedva da postignu velike brzine kao destilaciju. Međutim, metode destilacije zahtevaju velike količine nezabeliranih podataka i skupe su za trening. U ovom poslu predlažemo strukturiranu metodu pružanja kofija za zadatak, koja dostavlja veoma paralleliziranu podmrežu i odgovara metodama destilacije u to čnosti i latenciji, a da ne približava bilo kakvim nepobeleženim podacima. Naš ključni uvid je da zajednički izbrišemo module sa oštećenjem svakog parametra sa maskama različitih granularnosti (npr. glava i skrivenih jedinica). Takoðe smo smislili strategiju destilacije slojeva za prenošenje znanja od nepotrebnih na obrezane modele tokom optimizacije. Naši eksperimenti na podacima GLUE i SQuAD pokazuju da CoFi daje modele sa preko 10X brzinama sa malim kapom tačnosti, pokazujući svoju efikasnost i efikasnost u usporedbi sa prethodnim pristupima pružanja i destilacije.', 'ro': 'Dimensiunea tot mai mare a modelelor de limbaj neural a condus la o atenție sporită în compresia modelului. Cele două abordări predominante sunt tăierea, care elimină treptat greutățile dintr-un model pre-antrenat, și distilarea, care antrenează un model compact mai mic pentru a se potrivi cu unul mai mare. Metodele de tăiere pot reduce semnificativ dimensiunea modelului, dar cu greu obțin viteze mari ca distilare. Cu toate acestea, metodele de distilare necesită cantități mari de date fără etichete și sunt costisitoare de instruit. În cadrul acestei lucrări, propunem o metodă de tăiere structurată specifică sarcinii CoFi (Grosier- și Fine-Granined Pruning), care oferă subrețele extrem de paralelizabile și se potrivește metodelor de distilare atât în precizie, cât și în latență, fără a recurge la date neetichetate. Înțelegerea noastră cheie este de a tăia împreună modulele cu granule grosiere (de exemplu, straturi) și cu granule fine (de exemplu, capete și unități ascunse), care controlează decizia de tăiere a fiecărui parametru cu măști de granularitate diferită. De asemenea, elaborăm o strategie de distilare stratificată pentru a transfera cunoștințele de la modele neîntrerupte la modele tăiate în timpul optimizării. Experimentele noastre pe seturile de date GLUE și SQUAD arată că CoFi produce modele cu viteze de peste 10X cu o mică scădere a preciziei, arătând eficiența și eficiența acestora în comparație cu abordările anterioare de tăiere și distilare.', 'so': "Tirada koritaanka ee muuqashada afka neurada ah waxaa sababtay inuu kordhiyo daryeelka daboolka. Labada habbood ee muhiimka ah waa garashada, taasoo si taxadar ah uga qaadi miisaanka model hore, iyo kala soobixinta, kaasoo ku tababarida qaababka heshiiska yar si uu u dhigo mid ka weyn. Isticmaalka lagu sameynayo waxay si aad ah u hoosaysiin karaan qiyaastii modellka, laakiin si adag ayaa u gaadhi kara dhaqdhaqaaq aad u weyn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababka kala duwan waxay u baahan yihiin tiro badan oo aan la aqoon karin, waxbarashadana way qaali yihiin. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab aad u gaar ah CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-grabbed), kaas oo soo bixiya shabakado aad u siman, oo u eg qaababka kala soocnaanta si saxda ah iyo dhaqdhaqaaqa, iyadoon isticmaalin macluumaad aan la aqoon. Indhahayaga muhiimka ah waa in la wada qabsado qalabka kooxaha leh (tusaale ahaan qasnadaha) iyo qalabka wanaagsan (tusaale ahaan madaxa iyo qaybaha qarsoon), kaas oo maamula go'aanka go'aanka ku saabsan parameter kasta oo leh wajiyada kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa qoraal kala sooc ah si aan aqoonta looga wareejiyo tusaalooyin aan la garanayn. Imtixaanadayada GLUE iyo SQuAD-ka soo saaran waxay muujiyaan in CoFi soo saaraa modello ka badan 10X degaanka si saxda ah, wuxuuna tusaa effekteeda iyo efficienceeda, iyadoo la barbarbardhiga qaabilaadaha hore iyo qaabilaadda.", 'sv': 'Den växande storleken på neurala språkmodeller har lett till ökad uppmärksamhet i modellkomprimering. De två dominerande metoderna är beskärning, som gradvis tar bort vikter från en färdigtränad modell, och destillation, som tränar en mindre kompakt modell för att matcha en större modell. Beskärningsmetoder kan avsevärt minska modellstorleken men knappast uppnå stora hastigheter som destillation. Destillationsmetoder kräver dock stora mängder omärkta data och är dyra att utbilda. I detta arbete föreslår vi en uppgiftsspecifik strukturerad beskärningsmetod CoFi (grov- och finkornig beskärning), som levererar mycket parallella undernätverk och matchar destillationsmetoderna i både noggrannhet och latens, utan att tillgripa någon omärkt data. Vår viktigaste insikt är att tillsammans beskära grovkorniga (t.ex. lager) och finkorniga (t.ex. huvuden och dolda enheter) moduler, som styr beskärningsbeslutet för varje parameter med masker av olika granularitet. Vi utformar också en lagervis destillationsstrategi för att överföra kunskap från opranerade till beskurna modeller under optimering. Våra experiment på GLUE- och SQUAD-datauppsättningar visar att CoFi ger modeller med över 10X hastigheter med en liten noggrannhetsminskning, vilket visar dess effektivitet och effektivitet jämfört med tidigare beskärnings- och destillationsmetoder.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයුරෝල් භාෂාව මොඩේල් එකේ විශාල වැඩි ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩි කරලා තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් දෙන්නා ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dර ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂයෙන් මොඩල් ප්\u200dරමාණය අඩු කරන්න පුළුවන් නමුත් විශාල වේගයක් විශේෂ නමුත්, විශාලනය විදිහට ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ නැති තොරතුරු ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ සහ ක මේ වැඩේ අපි විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ ස්ථාපනය කරපු ප්\u200dරවේශය CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-Graned Pruning), ඒක ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය සබ්ජාලය ලබාගන්න පුළුවන් සබ්ජාලය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය සඳහ අපේ යතුරු පරීක්ෂණය තමයි කෝර්ස් ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් හැම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය අපි හොඳින් විශ්වාසයෙන් දැනගන්න ලේයර්විස් විශ්වාසයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය GLUE සහ SQuAD දත්ත සේට් වලට පෙන්වන්නේ CoFi ප්\u200dරමාණය 10X වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ හැකියාවක් ප', 'ta': 'புதிய மொழி மாதிரிகளின் வளர்ச்சியின் அளவு மாதிரி சுருக்கத்தில் கவனத்தை அதிகரித்து விட்டது. இந்த இரண்டு முக்கிய முறையான முறைமையான முறைமையில் இருந்து எடைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது, அது முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியில் இருந்து எடைகளை  முயற்சி முறைகள் மாதிரி அளவை முறையாக குறைக்க முடியும், ஆனால் பெரிய வேகத்தை பிரிப்பாக பெற முடியாது. ஆயினும், பிரிப்பு முறைகளுக்கு பெரிய குறிப்பிடப்படாத தரவு தேவைப்படுகிறது பயிற்சியில் விலையானது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு பணிக்குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட முறைமையான கோபி( குறிப்பு- மற்றும் நல்ல - கிடைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்படுத்தல்) முறையை வழங்குகிறது, அது மிகவ எங்கள் முக்கிய பார்வை ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட தெளிவான குறுக்குப் பிடிக்கப்பட்ட (உ. ம். அடுக்கு) நாம் ஒரு அடுக்கு வித்தியாசமான பிரிவு திட்டத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம் அதிகாரத்திற்கு போது அறிவை மாற்றுவதற்கு அறி GLUE மற்றும் SQuAD தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது CoFi மாதிரிகளை 10X க்கு மேற்பட்ட வேகம் கொண்டு ஒரு சிறிய தெளிவான வேகத்தில் கொண்டு வருகிறத', 'ur': 'نئورل زبان نمڈلوں کی بڑھنے کی اندازہ موڈل کمپرس میں اضافہ کیا گیا ہے۔ ان دونوں معاملات کے قریبوں کو پرینگ کر رہے ہیں، جو ایک پیش آموزش کی مدل سے وزن کو ہٹاتے ہیں، اور تفریق، جو ایک چھوٹی کمکت مدل کی آموزش کرتی ہے اور ایک بڑی مدل کے ساتھ مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق کرتی ہے. ڈرانینگ طریقے موڈل کی سائز بہت اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں لیکن بہت اضافہ کے طور پر بہت اضافہ پہنچ سکتے ہیں۔ However, distillation methods require large amounts of unlabeled data and are expensive to train. اس کام میں ہم نے ایک کام مشخص طریقہ پرینگ طریقہ CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-grained Pruning) کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو بہت مشخص ساب نیٹ ورک کرتا ہے اور دقیق اور لاٹینٹی کے مطابق مختلف طریقے کے مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے، بغیر کسی غیر معلوم ہونے والی دادہ کے. اور ہماری اصلی نظر یہ ہے کہ ہم ایک دوسرے سے دھوپ کے ذریعے اور دھوپ کے ذریعے موجودات کاٹ دیں جو ہر پارامیٹ کا فیصلہ کرتا ہے اور مختلف زیادتی کے ماسکوں سے ماسک کرتا ہے ہم نے بھی ایک لائرے ڈیلیٹ استراتژی کی تدبیر کی ہے کہ علم کو بغیر فعال ہونے کے موقع بغیر فعال ہونے والی مدلکوں کی طرف لے آئیں۔ ہماری آزمائش GLUE اور SQuAD ڈاٹ سٹ کے بارے میں دکھاتی ہے کہ کوفی نے 10X سے زیادہ سرعت کے مطابق ایک چھوٹی دھوپ کے ذریعہ مدلکوں کو دکھاتا ہے، اس کے اثرات اور اثرات کو پہلے دھوپ اور دھوپ کے مطابق دکھاتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Ikki eng muhim usullar sotuvchidir, bu bir taʼminlovchi modeldan taʼminlovchi boshqaruvni olib tashlaydi. Bu bir kichkina kompyuterning modelini bir katta birga moslash uchun o'rnatish mumkin. Name Lekin, ajratish usullar bilan hech qanday ko'p maʼlumot kerak va taʼminlovchi qiymatdir. Bu vazifani biz tashkilotga tayyorlangan qo'llangan CoFi usulini talab qilamiz. U juda mos keladigan tub tarmoq tarmoqlarini olib tashlaydi va tayyorlash usullarini faqat va hech qanday maʼlumot yordamida qo'llanmaydi. Bizning muhim ko'rinishimiz birlashtirilgan koʻp grammatika (m. g. qatlamlar) va ajoyib qo'llangan modullar, va har bir parametrlarning boshqa granulik masklarini boshqarish. Biz o'ylab ko'rsatuvchi modellardan o'zgartirish uchun qatlamni ajratish strategini yaratdik. GLUE va SQuAD maʼlumotlar tarkibida taʼminlovchimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, CoFi taʼminlovchi modellarni 10X dan ortiq tezlik tezligi bilan kichkina foydalanishini ko'rsatadi. Bu oldingi soʻzni va ajratish usullarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Sự tăng cường của các mô hình ngôn ngữ thần kinh đã làm tăng sự chú ý trong mô hình nén. Hai phương pháp hàng đầu là tỉa dần, nó sẽ loại bỏ trọng lượng từ một mô hình được huấn luyện trước, và chưng cất, nơi sản xuất một mô hình nhỏ hơn so với mô hình lớn hơn. Cách lọc có thể giảm đáng kể quy mô hình nhưng hầu như không đạt được tốc độ lớn khi chưng cất. Tuy nhiên, phương pháp chưng cất đòi hỏi một lượng lớn dữ liệu chưa được đóng băng và rất đắt tiền để huấn luyện. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp cắt tỉa cơ cấu đặc biệt (Coathô- và fine- tiven) chuyên cung cấp các mạng phụ trợ hoàn hảo tương đồng và khớp với các phương pháp chưng cất, cả về độ chính xác lẫn tiềm ẩn, mà không cần phải nhờ dữ liệu chưa mang tính. Quan điểm mấu chốt của chúng ta là cùng cắt giảm các lớp dày (v.d. các lớp) và các mô- đun màu sắc (v.d., đầu và các đơn vị giấu) được cấu tạo, điều khiển các quyết định cắt tỉa của mỗi tham số với mặt nạ có độ hạt khác nhau. Chúng tôi cũng phát minh ra một chiến lược chưng cất công nghệ để chuyển tri thức từ mẫu chưa được loại bỏ sang mẫu bị tỉa trong thời gian thuận. Những thí nghiệm trên các tập tin về GLUE và SQurac cho thấy CoFi cung cấp các mô hình với tốc độ cao hơn 10X với một độ chính xác nhỏ, cho thấy hiệu quả và hiệu quả của nó so với các phương pháp cắt tỉa và chưng cất trước.', 'da': 'Den voksende størrelse af neurale sprogmodeller har ført til øget opmærksomhed i modelkomprimering. De to fremherskende metoder er beskæring, som gradvist fjerner vægte fra en prætrænet model, og destillation, der træner en mindre kompakt model til at matche en større model. Beskæringsmetoder kan reducere modelstørrelsen betydeligt, men næppe opnå store hastigheder som destillation. Destillationsmetoder kræver imidlertid store mængder ikke mærkede data og er dyre at træne. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en opgavespecifik struktureret beskæringsmetode CoFi (Groft- og Fine-Grained Pruning), som leverer meget paralleliserbare undernetværk og matcher destillationsmetoderne i både nøjagtighed og latens uden at ty til nogen uheldige data. Vores vigtigste indsigt er i fællesskab at beskære grovkornede (f.eks. lag) og finkornede (f.eks. hoveder og skjulte enheder) moduler, som styrer beskæringsbeslutningen for hver parameter med masker af forskellig granularitet. Vi udarbejder også en lagvis destillationsstrategi for at overføre viden fra unruned til beskåret modeller under optimering. Vores eksperimenter med GLUE og SQUAD datasæt viser, at CoFi giver modeller med over 10 gange hastighed med et lille nøjagtighedsfald, hvilket viser dens effektivitet og effektivitet sammenlignet med tidligere beskæring og destillation metoder.', 'bg': 'Нарастващият размер на невронните езикови модели доведе до увеличаване на вниманието при компресирането на моделите. Двата преобладаващи подхода са подрязването, което постепенно премахва тежестите от предварително обучен модел, и дестилацията, която обучава по-малък компактен модел, за да съответства на по-голям. Методите на подрязване могат значително да намалят размера на модела, но едва ли постигат големи ускорения като дестилация. Методите за дестилация обаче изискват големи количества данни без етикет и са скъпи за обучение. В тази работа предлагаме специфичен за задачата структуриран метод за подрязване който осигурява високо успоредни подмрежи и съответства на методите на дестилация както в точност, така и в латентност, без да прибягва до никакви немаркирани данни. Нашето ключово разбиране е съвместно да подрязваме грубозърнести (напр. слоеве) и финозърнести (напр. глави и скрити единици) модули, които контролират решението за подрязване на всеки параметър с маски с различна гранулираност. Ние също така разработваме стратегия за дестилация на слоеве, за да прехвърлим знания от необработени към подрязани модели по време на оптимизация. Нашите експерименти с набори от данни показват, че произвежда модели с над 10Х ускорения с малък спад на точността, което показва ефективността и ефективността му в сравнение с предишните подходи за подрязване и дестилация.', 'nl': 'De groeiende omvang van neurale taalmodellen heeft geleid tot verhoogde aandacht in modelcompressie. De twee overheersende benaderingen zijn snoeien, waarbij geleidelijk gewicht wordt verwijderd van een voorgetraind model, en distillatie, waarbij een kleiner compact model wordt getraind om aan een groter model te voldoen. Snoeimethoden kunnen de modelgrootte aanzienlijk verkleinen, maar nauwelijks grote versnellingen bereiken als destillatie. Destillatiemethoden vereisen echter grote hoeveelheden gegevens zonder label en zijn duur om te trainen. In dit werk stellen we een taakspecifieke gestructureerde snoeimethode CoFi (Grove- en Fine-granined Snoning) voor, die zeer parallelliseerbare subnetwerken levert en de distillatiemethoden qua nauwkeurigheid en latentie overeenkomt, zonder gebruik te maken van ongelabelde gegevens. Ons belangrijkste inzicht is het gezamenlijk snoeien van grofkorrelige (bijv. lagen) en fijnkorrelige (bijv. koppen en verborgen eenheden) modules, die de snoeibesluit van elke parameter regelt met maskers van verschillende granulariteit. Ook ontwikkelen we een gelaagde distillatiestrategie om tijdens optimalisatie kennis over te dragen van ongeboren naar gesnoeide modellen. Onze experimenten met GLUE en SQuAD datasets tonen aan dat CoFi modellen levert met meer dan 10x snelheden met een kleine nauwkeurigheidsverlies, wat de effectiviteit en efficiëntie laat zien in vergelijking met eerdere snoei- en distillatiebenaderingen.', 'de': 'Die wachsende Größe neuronaler Sprachmodelle hat zu einer erhöhten Aufmerksamkeit bei der Modellkompression geführt. Die beiden vorherrschenden Ansätze sind das Beschneiden, das allmählich Gewichte von einem vortrainierten Modell entfernt, und die Destillation, bei der ein kleineres kompaktes Modell trainiert wird, um zu einem größeren Modell zu passen. Schnittverfahren können die Modellgröße deutlich reduzieren, aber kaum große Beschleunigungen als Destillation erreichen. Destillationsmethoden erfordern jedoch große Mengen an nicht gekennzeichneten Daten und sind teuer zu trainieren. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine aufgabenspezifische strukturierte Beschneidungsmethode CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-Grained Pruning) vor, die hochparallelisierbare Subnetze liefert und die Destillationsmethoden sowohl in Genauigkeit als auch in Latenz übereinstimmt, ohne auf unbekennzeichnete Daten zurückzugreifen. Unsere wichtigste Erkenntnis besteht darin, gemeinsam grobkörnige (z.B. Schichten) und feinkörnige (z.B. Köpfe und versteckte Einheiten) Module zu beschneiden, die die Beschneidungsentscheidung jedes Parameters mit Masken unterschiedlicher Granularität steuern. Darüber hinaus entwickeln wir eine schichtweise Destillationsstrategie, um Wissen von ungeschnittenen auf beschnittene Modelle während der Optimierung zu übertragen. Unsere Experimente an GLUE- und SQuAD-Datensätzen zeigen, dass CoFi Modelle mit über 10-facher Beschleunigung mit einem kleinen Genauigkeitsabfall liefert, was seine Effektivität und Effizienz im Vergleich zu früheren Beschneidungs- und Destillationsansätzen zeigt.', 'id': 'Ukuran tumbuh dari model bahasa saraf telah menyebabkan perhatian meningkat dalam kompresi model. Dua pendekatan yang dominan adalah pemotongan, yang secara perlahan-lahan menghapus berat dari model yang terlatih-terlatih, dan destilasi, yang melatih model kompakt yang lebih kecil untuk cocok dengan model yang lebih besar. Metode pengusiran dapat mengurangi ukuran model secara signifikan tetapi hampir tidak mencapai speedups besar sebagai destilasi. Namun, metode destilasi membutuhkan jumlah besar data yang tidak diberi tanda dan mahal untuk dilatih. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan metode pruning strukturasi spesifik tugas CoFi (Coarse- dan Fine-grained Pruning), yang menyediakan subjaringan yang sangat paralelis dan cocok dengan metode destilasi dalam akurasi dan latensi, tanpa menggunakan data yang tidak diberi tanda. Penglihatan kunci kita adalah untuk bersama-sama mencabut modul-modul berubah lebar (contohnya lapisan) dan berubah lebar (contohnya kepala dan unit tersembunyi), yang mengendalikan keputusan mencabut setiap parameter dengan topeng berbeda granularitas. Kami juga merencanakan strategi destilasi secara lapisan untuk memindahkan pengetahuan dari model yang belum dilakukan ke model yang dipotomisasi selama optimisasi. Eksperimen kami pada set data GLUE dan SQuAD menunjukkan bahwa CoFi menghasilkan model dengan lebih dari 10X speedups dengan titik akurasi kecil, menunjukkan efektivitas dan efisiensinya dibandingkan dengan pendekatan pemotongan dan destilasi sebelumnya.', 'hr': 'Povećana veličina modela neuralnog jezika dovela je do povećanja pažnje u kompresiji modela. Dva predsjednička pristupa pružaju, koja postupno uklanja težinu iz predobučenog model a i destilacija, koja trenira manji kompaktni model kako bi odgovarala većem. Metodi pružanja mogu značajno smanjiti veličinu modela, ali jedva postići velike brzine kao destilacija. Međutim, metode destilacije zahtijevaju velike količine nezabeliranih podataka i skupe su za obuku. U ovom poslu predlažemo strukturirani način za pružanje zadataka CoFi (obale i fino zrno pružanje), koji dostavlja vrlo parallelizirajuće podmreže i odgovara metodima destilacije u to čnosti i latenciji, bez rezultacije na bilo koji neizbjeđeni podaci. Naš ključni uvid je da zajednički izbrišemo module koji kontrolišu odluku o pružanju svakog parametra s maskama različitih granularnosti. Također smo smislili strategiju destilacije slojeva za prenošenje znanja iz nepristojenog na obrezane modele tijekom optimizacije. Naši eksperimenti na podacima GLUE i SQuAD pokazuju da CoFi pruža modele sa preko 10X brzina sa malim smanjenjem preciznosti, pokazujući svoju učinkovitost i učinkovitost u usporedbi s prethodnim pristupima pružanja i destilacije.', 'fa': 'اندازه افزایش مدل زبان عصبی به توجه افزایش در مجبور مدل رسید. دو دسترسی بزرگتری دارند که به تدریج وزن را از یک مدل پیش آموزش داده می\u200cکند و تدریج می\u200cکند، که یک مدل کوچک کوچک را آموزش می\u200cدهد تا با یک مدل بزرگتری هماهنگ کند. روش\u200cهای پیشرفت می\u200cتواند اندازه\u200cهای مدل را significantly کاهش دهد ولی به سختی سرعتهای بزرگ به عنوان تفاوت رسید. ولی روش\u200cهای جدایی نیاز به مقدار زیادی از داده\u200cهای غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cکنند و برای آموزش گرون هستند. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش ساخته\u200cشده\u200cی کافی (Pruning Coarse-and Fine-grain) که به زیر شبکه\u200cهای بسیار متفاوتی می\u200cکند و با روش\u200cهای متفاوت\u200cسازی در هر دو دقیق و تاریکی، بدون رسیدن به هیچ داده\u200cای متفاوت نمی\u200cشود. مشاهده\u200cی کلید ما این است که مدول\u200cهایی از دانه\u200cها و دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای (مثلاً سرها و واحدهای مخفی) را با ماسک\u200cهای granularity متفاوت کنترل می\u200cکند که تصمیم پاکیزه\u200cهای هر پارامتر را کنترل می\u200cکند. ما همچنین یک استراتژی جدا کردن طبقه برای انتقال علم از غیرقابل تحریک به مدل\u200cهای پاک در حالی optimization طراحی می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای GLUE و SQuAD نشان می\u200cدهند که CoFi با سرعتهای بیش از ۱۰X با یک کاهش دقیق کوچک، موثرت و موثرتش را در مقایسه با نزدیک\u200cهای کاهش و تفسیر قبلی نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Ukubwa wa mifano ya lugha ya uraia umesababisha kuongezeka kwa mtazamo wa kompyuta. Matokeo haya mawili muhimu ni madhubuti, ambayo kwa kawaida huondoa mizani kutoka kwenye mtindo wa zamani wa mafunzo, na kutofautisha, ambayo inafundisha mtindo mdogo wa makubaliano ili kupambana na moja kubwa zaidi. mbinu za kufanya kazi zinaweza kupunguza kiwango cha mifano lakini si vigumu kupata kiwango kikubwa kama tofauti. Hata hivyo, mbinu za kutofautisha zinahitaji kiasi kikubwa cha taarifa zisizoeleweka na ni ghali kwa mafunzo. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu maalum zilizotengenezwa na kazi za CoFi (Mapinduzi ya makosa na mazuri), ambayo hutoa mitandao yanayofanana sana na yanalinganisha na njia za tofauti katika uhakika na hata kwa siku za hivi karibuni, bila kutumia taarifa yoyote zisizoeleweka. Our key insight is to jointly prune coarse-grained (e.g., layers) and fine-grained (e.g., heads and hidden units) modules, which controls the pruning decision of each parameter with masks of different granularity.  Pia tunatengeneza mkakati wa kutofautisha kwa viwango vya juu ili kuhamisha maarifa kutokana na ukosefu wa kuelekea kwenye mifano yenye matumaini. Majaribio yetu kwenye seti za data za GLUE na SQuAD zinaonyesha kwamba CoFi hutoa mifano yenye kiwango cha zaidi ya 10 X kwa kiwango kidogo cha sahihi, wakionyesha ufanisi wake na ufanisi wake ukilinganishwa na mbinu zilizopita za kutofautisha.', 'af': "Die groot grootte van neurale taal modele het gelei om aandag in model kompresie te vermeerder. Die twee voordekende toegange is verdruk, wat gradief verwyder gewigte van 'n voordekende model en destilasie, wat 'n kleiner kompakte model trein om 'n groter model te ooreenstem. Verwyder metodes kan betekenlik die model grootte verklein maar moeilik groot speletjies as destilasie bereik word. Maar destilasie metodes benodig groot hoeveelheid ongeabelde data en is koste om te trein. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n taak-spesifieke structureerde pruning metode CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-grained Pruning), wat baie paralleliseerde subnetwerke berei en ooreenstem die destilasie metodes in beide presies en latensie, sonder om aan enige ongeabelde data te kry. Ons sleutel aansig is om saamstig kruis-korne (bv. lage) en fyn-korne (bv. koppe en verborge eenhede) modules te kruis, wat die kruis-besluit van elke parameter beheer met maskers van verskillende granulariteit. Ons het ook 'n laag-destilasie-strategie ontwerp om kennis te oordra van ongeloop na verdrukke modele tydens optimaliseering. Ons eksperimente op GLUE en SQuAD datastelle vertoon dat CoFi model vergee met meer 10X speedkoppe met 'n klein presisiteit afval, wat sy effektiviteit en effektiviteit vertoon vergelyk met vorige pruning en destilasie toegang.", 'ko': '신경 언어 모델의 규모가 끊임없이 확대됨에 따라 모델의 압축은 갈수록 주목을 받고 있다.두 가지 주요한 방법은 가위질을 하는 것이다. 이것은 점차적으로 미리 훈련한 모델에서 권중을 제거하고 증류하는 것이다. 이것은 비교적 작은 치밀한 모델을 훈련하여 비교적 큰 모델과 일치하도록 한다.가지치기 방법은 모델의 사이즈를 현저하게 줄일 수 있지만 증류법처럼 큰 가속을 실현하기 어렵다.그러나 증류 방법은 표기되지 않은 데이터가 대량으로 필요하고 훈련 원가가 높다.이 작업에서 우리는 임무에 특정된 구조화된 가지치기 방법인 코파이(굵은 입도와 가는 입도 가지치기)를 제시했다. 이 방법은 고도로 병행될 수 있는 서브네트워크를 제공하고 정확성과 지연에 있어서 추출 방법과 일치하며 표시되지 않은 데이터를 호소할 필요가 없다.우리의 관건적인 통찰은 굵은 입도(예를 들어 층)와 가는 입도(예를 들어 머리와 숨김 단원) 모듈을 연합하여 서로 다른 입도의 마스크로 매개 변수의 커팅 결정을 제어하는 것이다.우리는 또한 층별 증류 전략을 설계하여 최적화 과정에서 지식이 실행되지 않은 모델을 커팅 모델로 옮겼다.GLUE와 SQuad 데이터 집합에서의 실험에 의하면 코피가 생성한 모델은 10배가 넘는 가속비를 가지고 정밀도가 매우 낮으며 이전의 가위질과 증류 방법에 비해 유효성과 효율을 나타냈다.', 'tr': 'Näral dil nusgalaryň ölçüsi örän köpräk bilen üns berip ýöredi. Iki esasy gollanşyk çyzgylýar, bu ýerde ýuwaşlyk öňünden okuwçylýan nusgadan çykarýar we çyzgylýar. Bu ýerde kiçi bir paket nusgasyny uly bir nusgasyna eşitmek üçin kiçi bir şekilde çykarýar. Pröňlenme metodlary nusgasyny örän azaltyp biler ýöne uly hatlary bejermek üçin azaltyp bilmez. Ýöne taýýarlama metodlarynyň uly sany ýazylmaz maglumatlary gerek we otlamak üçin wagt. Bu işde biz CoFi (Coarse- we Fine-grained Pruning) sistemasynda takykly bir taýýarlama teklip edip, beýleki paralleliýan alt şebekeleri saýlaýar we hem dogry we ýagdaýynda takyklaýan çykyş metodlaryna eşleýäris. Açyk düşünjelerimiz diňe gaty çeken (meselm. kalamlar) we süýtgeli (meselm. kelle we gizlenen unit) modulleri bilelikde kesmelidir. Bu parameterleriň ýigrenç kararyny beýleki granularyň maskalary bilen kontrol edýär. Biz hem gözlemek wagtynda bilimi ýüze ýüze çykarmak strategiýasyna düzenledik. GLUE we SQuAD veri setirlerinde biziň deneylerimiz CoFi 10-den üst süýtgedeler bilen kiçi bir takyk düşürmegi bilen nusgalary taýýarlandyrýar, öňki süýtgede we taýýarlanmagyň ýagdaýynda etkinlik we etkinlik edendigini görkezýär.', 'am': "የናውራዊ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች መጠን በሞዴል ድምፅ ላይ ማስታወቂያውን ያበዛል፡፡ የሁለቱ አዋቂዎች ግንኙነቶች ብልሃት ናቸው፣ ቀድሞ ተማርቷል የነበረውን ሚዛንን እና ትልቅ እና ትልቅ ነው፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ነገር ግን የልዩነት ዓይነቶች ብዙውን ያልታወቀ ዳታ ያስፈልጋሉ እናም ለማስተማር የከበረ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የተመሠረተውን የክፍለ ሥርዓት (Coarse- and Fine-grafted Prunning) እና ትክክለኛውን ደብዳቤ ሰጥቷል፡፡ የቁልፍ ዓይነታችን (ለምሳሌ ደረጃዎች) እና ጥሩ ምርጫዎች (ለምሳሌ ራሶች እና የተሰወረ ክፍሎች) ሚዶሎችን ለመቆጣጠር ነው፡፡ እና እውቀትን ከንጹሕ ወደሚለወጥ ዓይነቶች ለመለወጥ የደረጃ ምርጫ strategy እናደርጋለን፡፡ Our experiments on GLUE and SQuAD datasets show that CoFi yields models with over 10X speedups with a small accuracy drop, showing its effectiveness and efficiency compared to previous pruning and distillation approaches.", 'sq': 'Madhësia në rritje e modeleve të gjuhës nervore ka çuar në rritjen e vëmendjes në kompresionin e modelit. The two predominant approaches are pruning, which gradually removes weights from a pre-trained model, and distillation, which trains a smaller compact model to match a larger one.  Metodat e shtrëngimit mund të reduktojnë ndjeshëm madhësinë e modelit por mezi arrijnë shpejtësi të mëdha si distilim. Megjithatë, metodat e distillacionit kërkojnë sasi të mëdha të dhënash pa etiketë dhe janë të shtrenjta për të trajnuar. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një metodë të strukturuar për detyra CoFi (Pruning me kokërra të larta dhe të holla), e cila ofron nënrrjete shumë paralelizuese dhe përputhet me metodat e distillacionit në saktësi dhe latencë, pa përdorur asnjë të dhënë pa etiketë. Përfaqja jonë kryesore është të rrënojmë së bashku modulet e grumbulluara (për shembull, shtresa) dhe të holla (për shembull, koka dhe njësitë e fshehura) që kontrollojnë vendimin e rrënjes së çdo parametri me maska të granularitetit të ndryshëm. Ne gjithashtu hartojmë një strategji distillacioni në nivele për të transferuar njohuritë nga modele të papërpunuara në modele të pjekura gjatë optimizimit. Eksperimentet tona në grupet e të dhënave GLUE dhe SQuAD tregojnë se CoFi prodhon modele me më shumë se 10X shpejtësi me një rënie të vogël saktësisë, duke treguar efektshmërinë dhe efektshmërinë e saj krahasuar me metodat e mëparshme të pjekjes dhe distillacionit.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային լեզվի մոդելների աճող չափսը մեծացրեց ուշադրությունը մոդելի ճնշում: The two predominant approaches are pruning, which gradually removes weights from a pre-trained model, and distillation, which trains a smaller compact model to match a larger one.  Փորձման մեթոդները կարող են նշանակալիորեն նվազեցնել մոդելի չափսերը, բայց հազիվ են հասնում մեծ արագությունների դիսլիլացիայի համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, դիսլիլացիայի մեթոդները պահանջում են մեծ քանակությամբ անսահմանափակ տվյալներ և թանկ են վարժեցնելու համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք գործի մասնավոր կառուցվածքավորված խզբզելու մեթոդ Կոֆի (Կոֆի) որը տալիս է բարձր համեմատական ենթացանցեր և համապատասխանում է խզբզելու մեթոդներին ճշգրիտության և լանցիայի մեթոդներին, առանց օգտագործելու որևէ անսահմանափակ տվ Մեր գլխավոր ընկալումն այն է, որ միասին կտրենք խիստ ցորենի (օրինակ շերտեր) և նուրբ ցորենի (օրինակ գլխավորներ և թաքնված միավորներ) մոդուլներ, որոնք կառավարում են յուրաքանչյուր պարամետրի գլխավորման որոշումը տարբեր գլխավորության դիմակներով: Մենք նաև ստեղծում ենք մի շերտերով դիսլիլացիայի ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի տեղափոխենք գիտելիքները անփորձարկված մոդելներից մինչև պոպտիզացիայի ժամանակ: Մեր փորձարկումները GLUE-ի և SQUADի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ COFi-ն տալիս է մոդելներ ավելի քան 10X արագությամբ, փոքր ճշգրտության ընթացքում, ցույց տալով դրա արդյունավետությունը և արդյունավետությունը, համեմատած նախորդ խ', 'az': "Nöral dil modellerinin böyüklüyü modellərin sıxıntısında dikkatini artırdı. Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş modellərdən a ğırlığı və destilyasını təkrarlayır. Bu, daha böyük bir modellə uyuşmaq üçün daha kiçik kompakt modeli təhsil edir. Pruning metodları modellərin böyüklüyünü çox azaltır, amma böyük hızlandırmalar kimi destilasyona çatmaz. Lakin distillasyon metodlarının böyük sayıları yazılmadığı məlumatların və təhsil etmək üçün xərcləndirilir. Bu işdə, bizim qurbanlıqla müəyyən bir qurbanlıqla müəyyən bir qurbanlıq metodlarını CoFi təklif edirik ki, bu çox parallelizə olaraq apar a ğları təbliğ edir və hər ikisinin doğruluğuna və təkrarlanmasında destilasyon metodlarına uyuşar, heç bir məlumatlara istifadə etmədən. Bizim düzgün g örünüşümüz, hər parametr müxtəlif granuların maskaları ilə dəyişiklik dənələri və sünbül dənələri ilə birlikdə parçalanmaqdır. Biz həmçinin həmçinin öyrənmədiyimiz zaman bilgi göndərmək üçün çoxlu dəyişiklik stratejisini yaratdıq. GLUE və SQuAD verilənlərin təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, CoFi'nin 10-dən çox hızlı düşmələri ilə modelləri azaldığını göstərir, əvvəlki dəyişiklik və destilasyon yaxınlıqlarına salıb etkinlik və etkinlik göstərir.", 'ca': "La mida creixent dels models de llenguatge neural ha portat a una atenció més gran en la compressió del model. Els dos enfocaments predominants són la pruning, que gradualment elimina pesos d'un model pré-entrenat, i la distillació, que entrena un model més petit compacte que coincidi amb un més gran. Pruning methods can significantly reduce the model size but hardly achieve large speedups as distillation.  Però els mètodes de destilació requereixen grans quantitats de dades sense etiqueta i són costosos d'entrenar. En aquest treball, proposem un mètode de pruning estructurat específic per a les tasques CoFi (pruning de grans grossos i fins), que proporciona subxarxes altament parallelitzables i coincideix amb els mètodes de distillació en la precisió i la latencia, sense recurrir a dades no marcades. La nostra idea clau és recollir conjuntament móduls granulats grossos (per exemple, capes) i fins granulats (per exemple, cap i unitats amagades), que controlen la decisió de recollir cada paràmetre amb màscares de granularitat diferent. També dissenyem una estratègia de destilació per capa per transferir coneixements de models sense treballar a models prunats durant l'optimització. Els nostres experiments en conjunts de dades GLUE i SQuAD mostren que CoFi produeix models amb més de 10X speedups amb una petita reducció de precisió, mostrant la seva eficiència i eficiència comparats amb els enfocaments anteriors de pruning i distillació.", 'cs': 'Rostoucí velikost neuronových jazykových modelů vedla ke zvýšení pozornosti v kompresi modelů. Dva převládající přístupy jsou prořezávání, které postupně odstraňuje závaží z předcvičeného modelu, a destilace, která trénuje menší kompaktní model tak, aby odpovídal většímu modelu. Metody řezání mohou výrazně snížit velikost modelu, ale těžko dosáhnout velkých zrychlení jako destilace. Destilační metody však vyžadují velké množství neznačených dat a jsou drahé na výcvik. V této práci navrhujeme úlohově specifickou strukturovanou metodu řezání CoFi (hrubozrnné a jemnozrnné řezání), která poskytuje vysoce paralelizovatelné podsítě a odpovídá metodám destilace jak v přesnosti, tak v latenci, bez uchylování se k žádným neoznačeným datům. Naším klíčovým poznatkem je společně prořezávat hrubozrnné (např. vrstvy) a jemnozrnné (např. hlavy a skryté jednotky) moduly, které řídí rozhodnutí o prořezání každého parametru s maskami různé granulosti. Navrhujeme také strategii destilace vrstvy, která při optimalizaci přenáší znalosti z neprodukovaných na prořezané modely. Naše experimenty na datových sadách GLUE a SQuAD ukazují, že CoFi vytváří modely s více než 10x rychlostí s malým poklesem přesnosti, což ukazuje jeho efektivitu a efektivitu ve srovnání s předchozími přístupy k prořezávání a destilaci.', 'bs': 'Povećana veličina modela neuralnog jezika dovela je do povećanja pažnje u modelu kompresije. Dva predsjednička pristupa su pružanja, koja postupno uklanja težinu iz predobučenog model a i destilacija, koja trenira manji kompaktni model kako bi odgovarala većem. Metodi pružanja mogu značajno smanjiti veličinu modela, ali jedva da postignu velike brzine kao destilacija. Međutim, metode destilacije zahtijevaju velike količine nezabeliranih podataka i skupe su za trening. U ovom poslu predlažemo strukturiranu metodu pružanja za zadatak CoFi (obalno i fino zrno pružanje), koja dostavlja vrlo parallelizirane podmreže i odgovara metodama destilacije u to čnosti i latenciji, a da ne približava bilo kakvim nepabeliranim podacima. Naš ključni uvid je da zajednički izbrišemo module koji kontrolišu odluku o pružanju svakog parametra sa maskama različitih granularnosti. Također smo smislili strategiju destilacije slojeva za prenošenje znanja od nepristojenog na obrezane modele tijekom optimizacije. Naši eksperimenti na podacima GLUE i SQuAD pokazuju da CoFi daje modele sa preko 10X brzinama sa malim kapom preciznosti, pokazujući svoju efikasnost i učinkovitost u usporedbi sa prethodnim pristupima pružanja i destilacije.', 'bn': 'The growing size of neural language models has led to increased attention in model compression.  এই দুটি মূল্যবান প্রতিক্রিয়া বুদ্ধিমান, যা ধীরে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল থেকে ওজন সরিয়ে নেয় এবং বিচ্ছিন্ন করে দেয়, যা একটি ছোট কম্পাক্ট মডেল মোডেলের আকার কমাতে পারে কিন্তু বিচ্ছিন্ন হিসেবে বিশাল গতি পাওয়া যায় না। তবে বৈচিত্র্যের পদ্ধতি অনেক বিশাল পরিমাণ তথ্য প্রয়োজন এবং প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য দাম। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা একটি কাজের নির্দিষ্ট কাঠামো বুদ্ধিমালা পদ্ধতির প্রস্তাব করছি কোফি (কোস- আর ভালো গ্রেফতার করা) যা খুব সমান সাবনেটওয়ার্ক প্রদান করে এবং সঠিকভাবে এবং সাম্প্রত আমাদের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি হচ্ছে যোগাযোগে কোর্স গ্রেফতার (উদাহরণস্বরূপ স্তর) এবং সুন্দর গ্রেফতার (যেমন মাথা এবং গোপন ইউনিট), যা প্রত্যেক প্যারামি এছাড়াও আমরা একটি স্তরের বিচ্ছিন্ন কৌশল পরিকল্পনা করেছি যাতে জ্ঞান অনুপস্থিতি থেকে বিচ্ছিন্ন মডেল পরিবর্তন করা হয়। জিলিউই এবং স্কুয়াড ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে কফি ১০ এক্সের বেশী গতিতে মডেল উৎপন্ন করে একটি ছোট্ট সঠিকভাবে ড্রাউপ দিয়ে তার কার্যকর্ম এবং ক', 'et': 'Närvikeele mudelite kasvav suurus on toonud kaasa suurema tähelepanu mudeli tihendamisel. Kaks peamist lähenemisviisi on pügamine, mis järk-järgult eemaldab kaalu eelõpetatud mudelist, ja destilleerimine, mis koolitab väiksema kompaktse mudeli, mis sobib suurema mudeliga. Pügamismeetodid võivad märkimisväärselt vähendada mudeli suurust, kuid vaevalt saavutada suuri kiirendusi destilleerimisel. Destilleerimismeetodid nõuavad siiski suurt hulka märgistamata andmeid ja neid on kulukas koolitada. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ülesandespetsiifilise struktureeritud pügamismeetodi CoFi (Grosse- and Fine-terained Pruning), mis pakub väga paralleelseid alamvõrke ning sobib destilleerimismeetoditega nii täpsuses kui ka latentsuses, kasutamata märgistamata andmeid. Meie peamine ülevaade on ühiselt pügada jämeda teralised (nt kihid) ja peenralised (nt pead ja peidetud üksused) moodulid, mis kontrollivad iga parameetri pügamisotsust erineva granulaarsusega maskidega. Samuti töötame välja kihilise destilleerimise strateegia, et optimeerimise ajal edasi kanda teadmisi töötamata mudelitest lõigatud mudelitele. Meie katsed GLUE ja SQuAD andmekogumitega näitavad, et CoFi toodab mudeleid üle 10kordse kiirendusega väikese täpsuse langusega, mis näitab selle efektiivsust ja efektiivsust võrreldes varasemate pügamis- ja destilleerimismeetoditega.', 'fi': 'Neurokielimallien koon kasvu on lisännyt huomiota mallien kompressiossa. Kaksi hallitsevaa lähestymistapaa ovat karsiminen, joka vähitellen poistaa painot valmiiksi koulutetusta mallista, ja tislaus, joka kouluttaa pienemmän kompaktin mallin vastaamaan suurempaa mallia. Leikkuumenetelmät voivat merkittävästi pienentää mallin kokoa, mutta tuskin saavuttaa suuria nopeuksia tislauksena. Tislausmenetelmät vaativat kuitenkin suuria määriä merkitsemättömiä tietoja ja ovat kalliita kouluttaa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme tehtäväkohtaista strukturoitua karsintamenetelmää CoFi (Grosse- and Fine-grained Pruning), joka tuottaa hyvin samansuuntaisia aliverkkoja ja vastaa tislausmenetelmiä sekä tarkkuudella että viiveellä turvautumatta mihinkään merkitsemättömään dataan. Keskeinen oivalluksemme on karsia yhdessä karkea (esim. kerrokset) ja hienorakeinen (esim. päät ja piilotetut yksiköt) moduulit, jotka ohjaavat jokaisen parametrin karsimispäätöstä eri rakeisilla maskeilla. Kehitämme myös kerroksittaisen tislausstrategian, jonka avulla tietoa voidaan siirtää hiomattomista malleista karsituihin malleihin optimoinnin aikana. Kokeemme GLUE- ja SQuAD-aineistoilla osoittavat, että CoFi tuottaa malleja, joissa on yli 10X nopeuksia pienellä tarkkuuden pudotuksella, mikä osoittaa sen tehokkuuden ja tehokkuuden verrattuna aikaisempiin karsimis- ja tislausmenetelmiin.', 'jv': 'Rasané kuwi banjur ing model sing larang de ingkang alat, dadi piyambak ateng ning model Awak dhéwé éntuk sing wis abasane sampe nggunggo, wong dhéwé kuwi nggolo nggawe ujaran model sing tolaran bantêr, lan padhir segala macem kuwi nggawe model komp sing yenyane sampe nggawe uwong sing wis ana. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sampeyan, ajeng-ajeng kotak diputuhke ditulak akeh dadi sing gak bener In this job, we proposal a task-special structural broning method CoFi (Cors- and Fine-granted Priuning), that offs extremely Paralelisable Subnets and match the Distruction Methods in every exact and LANYCK, no Resorting to some unbleed data. Awal dhéwé Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem Layer Mask Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan GLUE karo dataset nggawe coFi kuwi wis ngerasai model sing dadi 10 X dadi ngawarni winih dhéwé, iso nguasai efek karo akeh operasi lan ujarane nggawe gerakan sampek karo ndelah kuwi dianggap', 'bo': 'ནུས་གཞུང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱིས་མིང་དཔྱད་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན་པས་རྩིས་མཐུན་པ་ནང་དུ་ཆེ་ The two predominant approaches are pruning, which gradually removes weights from a pre-trained model, and distillation, which trains a smaller compact model to match a larger one. Pruning methods can significantly reduce the model size but hardly achieve large speeds as distillation. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་མེད་པའི་ཆ་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་ཚད་རེ་བ་དགོས། In this work, we propose a task-specific structured pruning method CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-grained Pruning), which delivers highly parallel subnetworks and matches the distillation methods in both accuracy and latency, without resorting to any unlabeled data. Our key insight is to jointly prune coarse-grained (e.g., layers) and fine-grained ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱིས་མ་ལག་ལས་གནད་རིས་བཀོད་པའི་བགོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our experiments on GLUE and SQuAD datasets show that CoFi yields models with over 10X speedups with a small accuracy drop, showing its effectiveness and efficiency compared to previous pruning and distillation approaches.', 'ha': "An ƙara girma girma cikin misalin misalin harshen neural har ya ƙẽtare zane cikin umarni motsi. Mataraikin biyu masu ƙaranci sune, ta tafiyar da nau'i fara ɗaya daga wani misalin mai zaman shirin, da kuma rarraba, wanda ya yi amfani da misali ƙaranci zuwa wani ƙarami. Tsarin tafiyar da shi yana iya ƙara girmar shirin ayuka, kuma amma bã da amfani ba ga sauri masu girma kamar da tsãge. A lokacin da, hanyoyin rarrabẽwa sun ƙayyade kiman yawan data na da ba'a yi wa'azi ba kuma yana kasancewa masu yin amfani da shi. In this work, we propose a task-specific structured pruning method CoFi (Coarse- and Fine-grained Pruning), which delivers highly parallelizable subnetworks and matches the distillation methods in both accuracy and latency, without resorting to any unlabeled data.  Bayanmu na gane shi ne da aka samu-naƙasan (misali, abubuwa) da cire-mai kyau (misali, madaidaici da sunayen ɓoye), wanda ke yi mamlaka ga gyangyawa ga kõwane parameter da maɓallin fuskar granufi dabam-dabam. Kayya, Muke ƙayyade wani takwai mai fassarar da ilmi zuwa misãlai masu sauce a lokacin da za'a shige shi ba. Kayan jarrabõnmu kan GLUU da SQuAD na nuna CoFi yana fitar misãlai da ke ƙara 10 X saukarwa da wani sauri mai taƙaita, kuma yana nũna fikancinsu da fassararsa sami da sami'a da takiyayen da suka gaba.", 'sk': 'Naraščajoča velikost modelov nevronskih jezikov je privedla do večje pozornosti pri kompresiji modelov. Prevladujoča pristopa sta obrezovanje, ki postopoma odstranjuje uteži iz vnaprej usposobljenega modela, in destilacija, ki trenira manjši kompaktni model, ki ustreza večjemu. Metode obrezovanja lahko bistveno zmanjšajo velikost modela, vendar komaj dosežejo velike pospešitve kot destilacija. Vendar pa destilacijske metode zahtevajo velike količine neoznačenih podatkov in so drage za usposabljanje. V tem delu predlagamo specifično nalogo specifično strukturirano metodo obrezovanja CoFi (Groose- and Fine-grained Obrezovanje), ki zagotavlja zelo vzporedna podomrežja in se ujema z metodami destilacije tako v natančnosti kot v latentnosti, brez uporabe neoznačenih podatkov. Naš ključni vpogled je skupno obrezovanje grobozrnatih (npr. plasti) in drobnozrnatih (npr. glave in skrite enote) modulov, ki nadzira odločitev o obrezovanju vsakega parametra z maskami različnih granulacij. Zasnovali smo tudi plastno destilacijsko strategijo za prenos znanja iz neobdelanih modelov na obrezane modele med optimizacijo. Naši poskusi na naborih podatkov GLUE in SQuAD kažejo, da CoFi prinese modele z več kot 10-kratnimi pospešitvami z majhnim padcem natančnosti, kar kaže njegovo učinkovitost in učinkovitost v primerjavi s prejšnjimi pristopi obrezovanja in destilacije.', 'he': 'הגודל הגדול של דוגמני שפת העצבית הוביל לתשומת לב גדולה בלחץ דוגמני. שני הגישויים הכובדות הן ניקוי, שמסיר באופן שלילי משקלים מודל מאומן מראש, ומשתוק, שמאמן מודל קטן וחמוק כדי להתאים מודל גדול יותר. שיטות פריצה יכולות להפחית באופן משמעותי את גודל המודל, אך בקושי להשיג מהירות גדולה כדיסטיל. בכל אופן, שיטות דיסטילה דורשות כמויות גדולות של נתונים ללא סימנים והן יקרות לאימון. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים שיטת שיקול מובנה מסויימת למשימה קופי, שמספקת רשתות תת-רשתות משותפות ביותר ומתאימות לשיטות הדיסילה בדיקת ומאוטנציה, מבלי להשתמש בשום נתונים ללא סימנים. ההבנה המרכזית שלנו היא לשטוף ביחד מודולים עם גרטנים גסים (למשל שכבות) ובגרטנים גסים (למשל ראשים וביחידות חבויות), אשר שולטת בהחלטת השטוף של כל פרמטר עם מסכות של גרטנות שונה. אנו גם מתכננים אסטרטגיה לשיטה כדי להעביר את הידע מדוגמנים ללא ניתוח לדוגמנים מתוך אופטימיזציה. Our experiments on GLUE and SQuAD datasets show that CoFi yields models with over 10X speedups with a small accuracy drop, showing its effectiveness and efficiency compared to previous pruning and distillation approaches.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'كيف يمكن أن تساعد البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في تنشيط اللغات المهددة بالاندثار؟ دراسة حالة وخريطة طريق للغة الشيروكي', 'pt': 'Como a PNL pode ajudar a revitalizar as línguas ameaçadas? Um Estudo de Caso e Roteiro para a Língua Cherokee', 'es': '¿Cómo puede la PNL ayudar a revitalizar las lenguas en peligro de extinción? Un estudio de caso y una hoja de ruta para el idioma cheroqui', 'fr': 'Comment la PNL peut-elle aider à revitaliser les langues en danger\xa0? Une étude de cas et une feuille de route pour la langue cherokee', 'ja': 'NLPは絶滅の危機に瀕する言語の活性化にどのように役立ちますか？チェロキー語のケーススタディとロードマップ', 'zh': 'NLP何以助兴濒危语? 切罗基语例究路线图', 'hi': 'एनएलपी लुप्तप्राय भाषाओं को पुनर्जीवित करने में कैसे मदद कर सकता है? चेरोकी भाषा के लिए एक केस स्टडी और रोडमैप', 'ru': 'Как NLP может помочь возродить языки, находящиеся под угрозой исчезновения? Тематическое исследование и дорожная карта для языка чероки', 'ga': 'Conas is féidir le NLP Cabhrú le Teangacha i mBaol a Athbheochan? Cás-Staidéar agus Treochlár don Teanga Cherokee', 'hu': 'Hogyan segíthet az NLP újraéleszteni a veszélyeztetett nyelveket? Esettanulmány és ütemterv a cherokee nyelvre', 'el': 'Πώς μπορεί να βοηθήσει στην αναζωογόνηση απειλούμενων γλωσσών; Μελέτη περίπτωσης και οδικός χάρτης για τη γλώσσα Τσερόκι', 'ka': 'როგორ შეუძლია NLP დახმარებული ენების რევიტალიზაცია? Name', 'it': 'Come può NLP aiutare a rivitalizzare le lingue minacciate? Un caso di studio e una tabella di marcia per la lingua cherokee', 'kk': 'NLP аяқталған тілдерді қайта қайталау мүмкін емес? Name', 'lt': 'How can NLP Help Revitalize Endangered Languages?  Čerokių kalbos atvejų tyrimas ir veiksmų planas', 'mk': 'Како може NLP да помогне во ревитализацијата на заканетите јазици? Студија на случаи и план за јазикот Чероки', 'ml': 'How can NLP Help Revitalize Endangered Languages?  ചെരോക്കി ഭാഷിക്കുവേണ്ടി ഒരു കേസ് സ്ട്രിഡിയും റോഡാപ്പും', 'ms': 'Bagaimana NLP boleh membantu menghidupkan semula bahasa yang mengancam? Name', 'mt': 'Kif jista’ l-NLP jgħin biex jiġu riveduti l-lingwi mhedda? A Case Study and Roadmap for the Cherokee Language', 'mn': 'NLP өөрчлөгдсөн хэлдээ хэрхэн дахин шинэчлэхэд туслах вэ? Чероки хэлний судалгаа, зам газрын зураг', 'pl': 'Jak NLP może pomóc ożywić języki zagrożone zagrożeniem? Studium przypadku i plan działania dla języka Cherokee', 'no': 'Korleis kan NLP hjelp gjenoppretta endra språk? Name', 'ro': 'Cum poate ajuta PNL să revitalizeze limbile pe cale de dispariție? Un studiu de caz și foaie de parcurs pentru limba cherokee', 'sr': 'Kako može NLP pomoći da revidira završene jezike? Proučavanje slučajeva i putna mapa za Cherokee jezik', 'si': 'කොහොමද NLP උදව් කරන්නේ ඉවරයි භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න? Name', 'so': 'Sidee caawimaadda NLP uu u beddeli karo luuqadaha la soo wareejiyey? Waxbarashada xaaladda iyo Roadmap ee luqada Cherokee', 'sv': 'Hur kan NLP hjälpa till att återuppliva hotade språk? En fallstudie och färdplan för cherokee språket', 'ur': 'NLP کی مدد کس طرح بدل ہوئی زبانوں کو دوبارہ تغییر کر سکتی ہے؟ Name', 'ta': 'எப்படி NLP உதவி மாற்றப்பட்ட மொழிகளை மீண்டும் மாற்ற முடியும்? Name', 'uz': '@ info: status Name', 'vi': 'Làm sao ngôn ngữ bị hạn chế nổi Tiếng ngọt ngào nổi? A Case study and Roadmap for the Cherokee language', 'hr': 'Kako može NLP pomoći revidirati završene jezike? Proučavanje slučajeva i putna mapa za Cherokee jezik', 'nl': 'Hoe kan NLP helpen bij het revitaliseren van bedreigde talen? Een case study en routekaart voor de Cherokee taal', 'da': 'Hvordan kan NLP hjælpe med at genoplive truede sprog? En case study og køreplan for Cherokee sproget', 'bg': 'Как може НЛП да помогне за съживяване на застрашените езици? Проучване на случай и пътна карта за черокия език', 'id': 'Bagaimana NLP bisa membantu menghidupkan kembali bahasa yang mengancam? A Case Study and Roadmap for the Cherokee Language', 'de': 'Wie kann NLP helfen, gefährdete Sprachen zu revitalisieren? Eine Fallstudie und Roadmap für die Cherokee Sprache', 'ko': 'NLP는 멸종 위기 언어 부흥을 어떻게 도와줍니까?체로키어의 사례 연구와 노선도', 'fa': 'Name Name', 'sw': 'NLP inawezaje kusaidia kurekebisha lugha zilizobadilika? Utafiti wa kesi na Roadmap kwa lugha ya Cherokee', 'tr': 'NLP Ahyrlanmış Diller täzeden geçirmekden nädip kömek edip biler? Çeroki dili üçin Case Study and Roadmap', 'af': 'Hoe kan NLP Hulp hersien Endangered Taal? Name', 'am': 'How can NLP Help Revitalize Endangered Languages?  A Case Study and Roadmap for the Cherokee ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Ինչպե՞ս կարող է ՆԼՊ-ը օգնել վերականգնել վտանգված լեզուները: Չերոկի լեզվի դեպքերի ուսումնասիրությունը և ճանապարհը', 'sq': 'Si mund të ndihmojë NLP të ringjallë gjuhët e kërcënuara? Një studim rastesh dhe hartë udhëzuese për gjuhën Cherokee', 'bs': 'Kako može NLP pomoći da revidira završene jezike? Proučavanje slučajeva i putna mapa za Cherokee jezik', 'az': 'NLP Qərclənmiş Dilləri necə dəyişdirə bilər? Çeroki dili üçün Case Study and Roadmap', 'bn': 'How can NLP Help Revitalize Endangered Languages?  চেরোকি ভাষার জন্য একটি কেস স্টিডি এবং রোডেপ্যাপ', 'ca': 'Com pot ajudar NLP a revitalitzar les llengües amenaçades? Un estudi de cas i un mapa de ruta per la llengua de Cherokee', 'cs': 'Jak může NLP pomoci revitalizovat ohrožené jazyky? Případová studie a plán pro jazyk Cherokee', 'et': 'Kuidas saab NLP aidata taaselustada ohustatud keeli? Tšerokee keele juhtumiuuring ja tegevuskava', 'fi': 'Miten NLP voi auttaa elvyttämään uhanalaisia kieliä? Tapaustutkimus ja etenemissuunnitelma cherokeen kielelle', 'ha': '@ item license (short name) KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Kako lahko NLP pomaga oživiti ogrožene jezike? Študija primera in časovni načrt za čerokejski jezik', 'jv': 'Piye isa NLP Tulung Ngubah Berusahaan Inggal Gak Beterjehan? A Case Case Learn and RAdvmap kanggo Language Kerok', 'he': "איך NLP יכול לעזור לחדש שפות מסוכנות? מחקר מקרים ומפה דרכים לשפה צ'רוקי", 'bo': 'NLP་གིས་གནས་ཡུལ་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚོར་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་ཅི་སྤྲོད་དགོས་སམ Cherokee སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ལྟ་བུ་དང་རྒྱུད་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་དང་།'}
{'en': 'We introduce MemSum (Multi-step Episodic Markov decision process extractive SUMmarizer), a reinforcement-learning-based extractive summarizer enriched at each step with information on the current extraction history. When MemSum iteratively selects sentences into the summary, it considers a broad information set that would intuitively also be used by humans in this task: 1) the text content of the sentence, 2) the global text context of the rest of the document, and 3) the extraction history consisting of the set of sentences that have already been extracted. With a lightweight architecture, MemSum obtains state-of-the-art test-set performance (ROUGE) in summarizing long documents taken from PubMed, arXiv, and GovReport. Ablation studies demonstrate the importance of local, global, and history information. A human evaluation confirms the high quality and low redundancy of the generated summaries, stemming from MemSum’s awareness of extraction history.', 'ar': 'أكثر من 43٪ من اللغات التي يتم التحدث بها في العالم معرضة للخطر ، ويحدث فقدان اللغة حاليًا بمعدل متسارع بسبب العولمة والاستعمار الجديد. أصبح الحفاظ على اللغات المهددة بالاندثار وتنشيطها أمرًا مهمًا للغاية للحفاظ على التنوع الثقافي على كوكبنا. في هذا العمل ، نركز على مناقشة كيف يمكن أن تساعد البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في تنشيط اللغات المهددة بالانقراض. نقترح أولاً ثلاثة مبادئ قد تساعد ممارسي البرمجة اللغوية العصبية على تعزيز التفاهم المتبادل والتعاون مع المجتمعات اللغوية ، ونناقش ثلاث طرق يمكن من خلالها مساعدة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في تعليم اللغة. ثم نأخذ لغة الشيروكي ، وهي لغة أمريكية أصلية مهددة بشدة ، كدراسة حالة. بعد مراجعة تاريخ اللغة والميزات اللغوية والموارد الحالية ، نصل (بالتعاون مع أعضاء مجتمع Cherokee) إلى بعض الطرق الهادفة التي يمكن لممارسي البرمجة اللغوية العصبية أن يتعاونوا بها مع شركاء المجتمع. نقترح طريقتين لإثراء موارد لغة الشيروكي من خلال المعالجة الآلية في الحلقة ، ومناقشة العديد من أدوات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية التي أبدى أفراد مجتمع الشيروكي اهتمامًا بها. ونأمل أن لا يخدم عملنا فقط إعلام مجتمع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الشيروكي ، ولكن أيضًا لتوفير الإلهام للعمل المستقبلي على اللغات المهددة بالانقراض بشكل عام.', 'fr': "Plus de 43\xa0% des langues parlées dans le monde sont menacées, et la perte de langue se produit actuellement à un rythme accéléré en raison de la mondialisation et du néocolonialisme. La sauvegarde et la revitalisation des langues menacées sont devenues très importantes pour préserver la diversité culturelle de notre planète. Dans ce travail, nous nous concentrons sur la façon dont la PNL peut aider à revitaliser les langues menacées. Nous suggérons d'abord trois principes qui peuvent aider les praticiens de la PNL à favoriser la compréhension mutuelle et la collaboration avec les communautés linguistiques, et nous discutons de trois façons dont la PNL peut potentiellement aider dans l'enseignement des langues. Nous prenons ensuite le cherokee, une langue amérindienne gravement menacée, comme étude de cas. Après avoir examiné l'histoire de la langue, les caractéristiques linguistiques et les ressources existantes, nous (en collaboration avec les membres de la communauté cherokee) arrivons à quelques moyens significatifs pour les praticiens de la PNL de collaborer avec des partenaires communautaires. Nous suggérons deux approches pour enrichir les ressources du langage cherokee avec le traitement machine-in-the-loop, et discutons de plusieurs outils de PNL qui intéressent les membres de la communauté cherokee. Nous espérons que notre travail servira non seulement à informer la communauté de la PNL sur le cherokee, mais aussi à inspirer les futurs travaux sur les langues menacées en général.", 'es': 'Más del 43% de los idiomas que se hablan en el mundo están en peligro, y la pérdida del idioma se produce actualmente a un ritmo acelerado debido a la globalización y el neocolonialismo. Salvar y revitalizar las lenguas en peligro de extinción se ha vuelto muy importante para mantener la diversidad cultural de nuestro planeta. En este trabajo, nos centramos en analizar cómo la PNL puede ayudar a revitalizar las lenguas en peligro de extinción. En primer lugar, sugerimos tres principios que pueden ayudar a los profesionales de la PNL a fomentar el entendimiento mutuo y la colaboración con las comunidades lingüísticas, y discutimos tres maneras en las que la PNL puede ayudar en la educación de idiomas. Luego tomamos el cheroqui, un idioma nativo americano en grave peligro de extinción, como caso de estudio. Después de revisar la historia del idioma, las características lingüísticas y los recursos existentes, nosotros (en colaboración con los miembros de la comunidad cherokee) llegamos a algunas formas significativas en que los profesionales de la PNL pueden colaborar con los socios de la comunidad. Sugerimos dos enfoques para enriquecer los recursos del idioma cheroqui con procesamiento automático y discutimos varias herramientas de PNL en las que la gente de la comunidad cheroqui ha mostrado interés. Esperamos que nuestro trabajo sirva no solo para informar a la comunidad de la PNL sobre el cheroqui, sino también para inspirar el trabajo futuro sobre las lenguas en peligro de extinción en general.', 'pt': 'Mais de 43% das línguas faladas no mundo estão ameaçadas, e a perda de línguas ocorre atualmente em um ritmo acelerado devido à globalização e ao neocolonialismo. Salvar e revitalizar línguas ameaçadas tornou-se muito importante para manter a diversidade cultural em nosso planeta. Neste trabalho, nos concentramos em discutir como a PNL pode ajudar a revitalizar línguas ameaçadas. Primeiro sugerimos três princípios que podem ajudar os praticantes de PNL a promover a compreensão mútua e a colaboração com as comunidades linguísticas, e discutimos três maneiras pelas quais a PNL pode potencialmente ajudar na educação linguística. Em seguida, tomamos o Cherokee, uma língua nativa americana gravemente ameaçada, como um estudo de caso. Depois de revisar a história do idioma, os recursos linguísticos e os recursos existentes, nós (em colaboração com membros da comunidade Cherokee) chegamos a algumas maneiras significativas de os praticantes de PNL colaborarem com os parceiros da comunidade. Sugerimos duas abordagens para enriquecer os recursos da linguagem Cherokee com processamento machine-in-the-loop, e discutimos várias ferramentas de PNL nas quais pessoas da comunidade Cherokee demonstraram interesse. Esperamos que nosso trabalho não sirva apenas para informar a comunidade de PNL sobre Cherokee, mas também para servir de inspiração para futuros trabalhos sobre línguas ameaçadas em geral.', 'ja': '世界で話されている言語の43%以上が危機に瀕しており、グローバル化と新植民地主義のために現在言語喪失が加速しています。 絶滅の危機に瀕する言語の保存と活性化は、地球の文化的多様性を維持するために非常に重要になりました。 この研究では、NLPが絶滅危惧言語の活性化にどのように役立つかについて議論することに焦点を当てています。 まず、NLPの実践者が言語コミュニティとの相互理解とコラボレーションを促進するのに役立つ可能性のある3つの原則を提案し、NLPが言語教育を支援する可能性のある3つの方法について話し合います。 次に、深刻な危機に瀕しているネイティブアメリカンの言語であるチェロキー語をケーススタディとして取り上げます。 言語の歴史、言語学的特徴、および既存のリソースを確認した後、（チェロキー族コミュニティメンバーと協力して） NLPの実践者がコミュニティパートナーとコラボレーションできるいくつかの有意義な方法に到達します。 マシンインザループ処理でチェロキー言語のリソースを豊かにするための2つのアプローチを提案し、チェロキーコミュニティの人々が興味を示したいくつかのNLPツールについて説明します。 私たちの仕事は、NLPコミュニティにチェロキー語について知らせるだけでなく、危機に瀕する言語に関する将来の仕事全般にインスピレーションを与えることにも役立つことを願っています。', 'zh': '世间过43%语濒临灭绝,全球化与新殖民主义语方速。 拯振濒危言,于我星球文多样性甚重。 注意讨论NLP何以助兴濒临灭绝语。 吾先建三道,可以助NLP从业者言社区之相知,吾论之矣NLP可以助言教者三矣。 然后以切罗基语(重濒临灭绝美洲原住民语)为例。 顾语史,言特征及见资之后,(与切罗基社区合)得NLP从业者可与社区合作伙伴合者有义。 建二术,机器以赡切诺基语之资,而论切罗基社区者兴数NLP之具。 愿吾事非徒使NLP社区知切诺基语,又能为未来濒危言之灵。', 'hi': 'दुनिया में बोली जाने वाली 43% से अधिक भाषाएं लुप्तप्राय हैं, और वर्तमान में वैश्वीकरण और नवऔपनिवेशवाद के कारण भाषा का नुकसान त्वरित दर से होता है। लुप्तप्राय भाषाओं को सहेजना और पुनर्जीवित करना हमारे ग्रह पर सांस्कृतिक विविधता को बनाए रखने के लिए बहुत महत्वपूर्ण हो गया है। इस काम में, हम इस बात पर चर्चा करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं कि एनएलपी लुप्तप्राय भाषाओं को पुनर्जीवित करने में कैसे मदद कर सकता है। हम पहले तीन सिद्धांतों का सुझाव देते हैं जो एनएलपी चिकित्सकों को भाषा समुदायों के साथ आपसी समझ और सहयोग को बढ़ावा देने में मदद कर सकते हैं, और हम तीन तरीकों पर चर्चा करते हैं जिसमें एनएलपी संभावित रूप से भाषा शिक्षा में सहायता कर सकता है। फिर हम चेरोकी, एक गंभीर रूप से लुप्तप्राय मूल अमेरिकी भाषा को एक मामले के अध्ययन के रूप में लेते हैं। भाषा के इतिहास, भाषाई विशेषताओं और मौजूदा संसाधनों की समीक्षा करने के बाद, हम (चेरोकी समुदाय के सदस्यों के सहयोग से) कुछ सार्थक तरीकों से पहुंचते हैं एनएलपी चिकित्सक सामुदायिक भागीदारों के साथ सहयोग कर सकते हैं। हम मशीन-इन-द-लूप प्रसंस्करण के साथ चेरोकी भाषा के संसाधनों को समृद्ध करने के लिए दो दृष्टिकोणों का सुझाव देते हैं, और कई एनएलपी उपकरणों पर चर्चा करते हैं जो चेरोकी समुदाय के लोगों ने रुचि दिखाई है। हम आशा करते हैं कि हमारा काम न केवल चेरोकी के बारे में एनएलपी समुदाय को सूचित करने के लिए कार्य करता है, बल्कि सामान्य रूप से लुप्तप्राय भाषाओं पर भविष्य के काम के लिए प्रेरणा प्रदान करने के लिए भी कार्य करता है।', 'ru': 'Более 43% языков, на которых говорят в мире, находятся под угрозой исчезновения, и потеря языка в настоящее время происходит ускоренными темпами из-за глобализации и неоколониализма. Сохранение и возрождение языков, находящихся под угрозой исчезновения, стало очень важным фактором сохранения культурного разнообразия на нашей планете. В этой работе мы сосредоточимся на обсуждении того, как NLP может помочь возродить исчезающие языки. Сначала мы предлагаем три принципа, которые могут помочь специалистам-практикам NLP развивать взаимопонимание и сотрудничество с языковыми сообществами, и мы обсуждаем три способа, с помощью которых NLP может потенциально помочь в языковом образовании. Затем мы рассмотрим Чероки, коренной американский язык, находящийся под серьезной угрозой исчезновения, в качестве примера. Проанализировав историю языка, лингвистические особенности и существующие ресурсы, мы (в сотрудничестве с членами сообщества чероки) пришли к выводу о том, что практические работники NLP могут сотрудничать с партнерами сообщества. Мы предлагаем два подхода к обогащению ресурсов языка чероки с помощью обработки машиной в цикле и обсуждаем несколько инструментов NLP, которые заинтересовали людей из сообщества чероки. Мы надеемся, что наша работа послужит не только информированию сообщества NLP о чероки, но и вдохновению для будущей работы над исчезающими языками в целом.', 'ga': 'Tá níos mó ná 43% de na teangacha a labhraítear ar fud an domhain i mbaol, agus faoi láthair cailltear teanga ag ráta luathaithe mar gheall ar dhomhandú agus neocolonialism. Tá sábháil agus athbheochan teangacha atá i mbaol an-tábhachtach chun an éagsúlacht chultúrtha ar ár bplainéad a chothabháil. San obair seo, dírímid ar phlé a dhéanamh ar conas is féidir le NLP cabhrú le teangacha atá i mbaol a athbheochan. Molaimid ar dtús trí phrionsabal a d’fhéadfadh cabhrú le cleachtóirí NLP comhthuiscint agus comhoibriú a chothú le pobail teanga, agus pléifimid trí bhealach inar féidir le NLP cuidiú le hoideachas teanga. Tógaimid Cherokee ansin, teanga Mheiriceá Dhúchasach atá i mbaol mór, mar chás-staidéar. Tar éis athbhreithniú a dhéanamh ar stair na teanga, ar ghnéithe teangeolaíochta, agus ar acmhainní atá ann cheana féin, tagann muid (i gcomhar le baill de phobal Cherokee) ar chúpla bealach fiúntach inar féidir le cleachtóirí NLP comhoibriú le comhpháirtithe pobail. Molaimid dhá chur chuige chun acmhainní na teanga Cherokee a shaibhriú le próiseáil meaisín-i-an-lúb, agus plé a dhéanamh ar roinnt uirlisí NLP a bhfuil suim léirithe ag daoine ó phobal Cherokee iontu. Tá súil againn go bhfreastalaíonn ár gcuid oibre ní hamháin ar an bpobal NLP a chur ar an eolas faoi. Cherokee, ach freisin chun inspioráid a thabhairt d’obair amach anseo ar theangacha i mbaol i gcoitinne.', 'ka': 'მსოფლიოში უფრო მეტი 43%-დან მეტი სიტყვების შეცდომია, და დოლობალიზაცია და ნეოკოლონიალიზმის შემდეგ ენის შეცდომის შეცდომის სიტყვებით ხდება. ჩვენი პლანეტიაში კულტურური განსხვავებას მხოლოდ მნიშვნელოვანია. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ განვითარებით, როგორ NLP შეუძლია დახმარება სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენ პირველად სამი პრინციპური დავიწყებთ, რომელიც შეიძლება NLP პრაქტიკონტერებისთვის დახმარება საერთო გაგრძნობა და მუშაობა ენის საზოგადოებთან, და ჩვენ ვთქვათ სამი გზების შემდეგ ჩვენ ჩეროკი, ძალიან დარწმუნებული სამყარო ამერიკანეთის ენაზე, როგორც სწავლად. ენერგიის ისტორიის შესახებ, ენერგისტიკური ფუნქციების და მსგავსი რესურსების შესახებ, ჩვენ (ჩეროკის საზოგადოებო მხოლოდ) ვიღებთ რამდენიმე მნიშვნელოვანი გზების შესახებ NLP პრაქტიკ ჩვენ მუშაობთ ორი მიღება ქეროკის ენის რესურსების გამოყენება მანქანის პროცესით, და განსაკუთრება რამდენიმე NLP ხელსაწყობილობი, რომელიც შროკის საზოგადოებაში ადამიანები ინტერესური ჩვენ ჩვენ გვემედით, რომ ჩვენი სამუშაო არა მხოლოდ ჩემი სამუშაო საზოგადოება ჩეროკის შესახებ ინფორმაციას, მაგრამ ჩემი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო', 'hu': 'A világon beszélt nyelvek több mint 43%-a veszélyeztetett, és jelenleg a globalizáció és a neokolonializmus miatt gyorsult a nyelvveszteség. A veszélyeztetett nyelvek megmentése és újraélesztése nagyon fontossá vált bolygónk kulturális sokszínűségének fenntartása szempontjából. Ebben a munkában arra összpontosítunk, hogy megvitassuk, hogyan segíthet az NLP újraéleszteni a veszélyeztetett nyelveket. Először is három olyan elvet javasolunk, amelyek segíthetnek az NLP szakembereinek a kölcsönös megértésben és a nyelvi közösségekkel való együttműködésben, és három módon vitatjuk meg, hogy az NLP potenciálisan segíthet a nyelvoktatásban. Ezután a Cherokee-t, egy súlyosan veszélyeztetett amerikai anyanyelvet vesszük esettanulmányként. A nyelv történetének, nyelvi jellemzőinek és meglévő erőforrásainak áttekintése után (a Cherokee közösség tagjaival együttműködve) néhány értelmes módon tudunk együttműködni a közösségi partnerekkel. Két megközelítést javasolunk a cherokee nyelv erőforrásainak gazdagítására a gép-in-the-loop feldolgozással, és megvitatjuk számos olyan NLP eszközt, amelyek iránt a cherokee közösség emberei érdeklődtek. Reméljük, hogy munkánk nemcsak arra szolgál, hogy tájékoztassa az NLP közösségét a cherokee-ről, hanem inspirációt is nyújtson a veszélyeztetett nyelvek jövőbeli munkájához általában.', 'el': 'Περισσότερο από 43% των γλωσσών που ομιλούνται στον κόσμο κινδυνεύουν και η απώλεια γλωσσών συμβαίνει σήμερα με επιταχυνόμενο ρυθμό λόγω της παγκοσμιοποίησης και της νεοαποικιοκρατίας. Η διάσωση και η αναζωογόνηση των απειλούμενων γλωσσών έχει γίνει πολύ σημαντική για τη διατήρηση της πολιτιστικής πολυμορφίας στον πλανήτη μας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στη συζήτηση πώς μπορεί να βοηθήσει στην αναζωογόνηση των απειλούμενων γλωσσών. Πρώτα προτείνουμε τρεις αρχές που μπορούν να βοηθήσουν τους επαγγελματίες να προωθήσουν την αμοιβαία κατανόηση και τη συνεργασία με τις γλωσσικές κοινότητες, και συζητάμε τρεις τρόπους με τους οποίους μπορεί ενδεχομένως να βοηθήσει στη γλωσσική εκπαίδευση. Στη συνέχεια, παίρνουμε την Τσερόκι, μια γλώσσα που απειλείται σοβαρά με εξαφάνιση, ως μελέτη περίπτωσης. Αφού εξετάσουμε το ιστορικό της γλώσσας, τα γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά και τους υπάρχοντες πόρους, εμείς (σε συνεργασία με τα μέλη της κοινότητας Τσερόκι) καταλήγουμε σε μερικούς σημαντικούς τρόπους συνεργασίας των επαγγελματιών του ΝΛΠ με τους εταίρους της κοινότητας. Προτείνουμε δύο προσεγγίσεις για τον εμπλουτισμό των πόρων της γλώσσας Τσερόκι με επεξεργασία μηχανής-σε-βρόχο, και συζητήσουμε διάφορα εργαλεία για τα οποία οι άνθρωποι από την κοινότητα Τσερόκι έχουν δείξει ενδιαφέρον. Ελπίζουμε ότι το έργο μας δεν θα χρησιμεύσει μόνο στην ενημέρωση της κοινότητας για τα Τσερόκι, αλλά και στην παροχή έμπνευσης για μελλοντικές εργασίες σχετικά με τις απειλούμενες γλώσσες γενικότερα.', 'it': "Più del 43% delle lingue parlate nel mondo sono minacciate e la perdita di lingua avviene attualmente ad un ritmo accelerato a causa della globalizzazione e del neocolonialismo. Salvare e rivitalizzare le lingue minacciate è diventato molto importante per mantenere la diversità culturale sul nostro pianeta. In questo lavoro, ci concentriamo sulla discussione su come PNL può aiutare a rivitalizzare le lingue in via di estinzione. In primo luogo proponiamo tre principi che possono aiutare i professionisti del PNL a promuovere la comprensione reciproca e la collaborazione con le comunità linguistiche, e discutiamo tre modi in cui il PNL può potenzialmente aiutare nell'educazione linguistica. Prendiamo poi il Cherokee, una lingua nativa americana gravemente minacciata, come caso di studio. Dopo aver esaminato la storia della lingua, le caratteristiche linguistiche e le risorse esistenti, arriviamo (in collaborazione con i membri della comunità Cherokee) ad alcuni modi significativi per collaborare con i partner della comunità. Suggeriamo due approcci per arricchire le risorse del linguaggio Cherokee con l'elaborazione machine-in-the-loop, e discutere di diversi strumenti NLP a cui le persone della comunità Cherokee hanno mostrato interesse. Speriamo che il nostro lavoro serva non solo a informare la comunità del PNL sul Cherokee, ma anche a fornire ispirazione per il futuro lavoro sulle lingue in via di estinzione in generale.", 'kk': 'Әлемдегі сөйлейтін тілдердің 43% дегеннен артық қауіпсіздік болады, және қазіргі тілдердің жоғалуы глобализациялық және неколониализмдік себебінен жылдамдық жылдамдығында бол Қазіргі тілдерді сақтау және қайта жалғастыру планетасында мәдениеттің түрлігін сақтау үшін өте маңызды болды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде NLP тілдерді қалай қалай көмектесуге көмектесуге көмектеседі. Біз біріншіден NLP профессионарларына көмектесетін үш принципі қолданып, тіл қоғамдарына біріктіру және біріктіру үшін көмектесетін, және NLP тіл оқытуына көмектесетін үш тәсілді талқылаймы Содан кейін Шероки тіліне жетілдік американдық тілді қауіпсіздік деп ойлаймыз. Тілдің тарихын қарастырудан кейін, лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді және барлық ресурстарды қарастырудан кейін, біз (Шероки коммуналық мүшелерімен бірге қатынап) NLP профессионарларының көп маңызды жолдарына келдік Біз Шерок тілінің ресурстарын машиналық жұмыс ішінде жұмыс істеу үшін екі жағдай жұмыс істейміз, және Шерок қоғамдарының бірнеше NLP құрылғыларын талқылаймыз. Біз жұмыс істегеніміз тек NLP көмегімен Шероки туралы ақпараттау үшін емес деп үміттенеміз, сондай-ақ жұмыс істегеніміз келесі тілдерге қауіпсіздік тілдерге', 'lt': "Daugiau kaip 43 proc. pasaulyje kalbėtų kalbų kyla grėsmė, o kalbų praradimas šiuo metu sparčiau atsiranda dėl globalizacijos ir neokolonializmo. Išgelbėti ir atgaivinti pavojingas kalbas tapo labai svarbia mūsų planetos kultūrinei įvairovei išlaikyti. Šiame darbe daugiausia dėmesio skiriame diskusijai, kaip NLP gali padėti atgaivinti pavojingų kalbų kūrimą. Pirmiausia siūlome tris principus, kurie gali padėti NLP specialistams skatinti tarpusavio supratimą ir bendradarbiavimą su kalbų bendruomenėmis, ir aptariame tris būdus, kaip NLP gali padėti kalbų mokymui. Tada Čeroki, rimtai pavojinga gimtosios Amerikos kalba, vertiname kaip atvejų tyrimas. After reviewing the language's history, linguistic features, and existing resources, we (in collaboration with Cherokee community members) arrive at a few meaningful ways NLP practitioners can collaborate with community partners.  We suggest two approaches to enrich the Cherokee language's resources with machine-in-the-loop processing, and discuss several NLP tools that people from the Cherokee community have shown interest in.  We hope that our work serves not only to inform the NLP community about Cherokee, but also to provide inspiration for future work on endangered languages in general.", 'mk': 'More than 43% of the languages spoken in the world are endangered, and language loss currently occurs at an accelerated rate because of globalization and neocolonialism.  Saving and revitalizing endangered languages has become very important for maintaining the cultural diversity on our planet.  In this work, we focus on discussing how NLP can help revitalize endangered languages.  Прво предложуваме три принципи кои може да им помогнат на практичарите на НЛП да поттикнат взаемно разбирање и соработка со јазичните заедници, и разговараме за три начини на кои НЛП може потенцијално да помогне во образованието на јазиците Потоа ќе го земеме Чероки, сериозно загрозен роден американски јазик, како случајна студија. По прегледот на историјата на јазикот, јазичните карактеристики и постојните ресурси, ние (во соработка со членовите на заедницата Чероки) постигнавме неколку значајни начини на кои практиките на НЛП можат да соработуваат со заедничките партнери. Предлагаме два пристапи за обогатување на ресурсите на јазикот Чероки со процесор на машина во циклус, и разговараме за неколку НЛП алатки во кои луѓето од заедницата Чероки покажаа интерес. We hope that our work serves not only to inform the NLP community about Cherokee, but also to provide inspiration for future work on endangered languages in general.', 'ms': "Lebih dari 43% dari bahasa yang dibicarakan di dunia dalam bahaya, dan kehilangan bahasa kini berlaku pada kadar yang dipercepat disebabkan globalisasi dan neokolonialism. Menyelamatkan dan menghidupkan semula bahasa yang mengancam telah menjadi sangat penting untuk mempertahankan pelbagai budaya di planet kita. Dalam kerja ini, kita fokus pada membincangkan bagaimana NLP boleh membantu menghidupkan semula bahasa yang mengancam. Kami pertama-tama mencadangkan tiga prinsip yang boleh membantu pelatih NLP untuk meningkatkan pemahaman dan kerjasama bersama-sama dengan komuniti bahasa, dan kami membincangkan tiga cara NLP berpotensi boleh membantu dalam pendidikan bahasa. Kemudian kita mengambil Cherokee, bahasa asli Amerika yang amat berbahaya, sebagai kajian kes. After reviewing the language's history, linguistic features, and existing resources, we (in collaboration with Cherokee community members) arrive at a few meaningful ways NLP practitioners can collaborate with community partners.  We suggest two approaches to enrich the Cherokee language's resources with machine-in-the-loop processing, and discuss several NLP tools that people from the Cherokee community have shown interest in.  Kami harap kerja kami tidak hanya berkhidmat untuk memberitahu komuniti NLP tentang Cherokee, tetapi juga untuk memberikan inspirasi untuk kerja masa depan pada bahasa yang mengancam secara umum.", 'ml': 'ലോകത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകളില്\u200d 43% കൂടുതല്\u200d അപകടം പിടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷ നഷ്ടം ഇപ്പോള്\u200d വേഗത്തില്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്ലോ അപകടത്തിലുള്ള ഭാഷകള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുകയും പുനരുത്ഥാപിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഭൂമിയിലെ സംസ്കാരികമായ വ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് NLP ഭാഷകളെ പുനരുത്ഥാപിക്കാന്\u200d സഹായിക്കുന്നതെന് നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നത് നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് NLP പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവരെ സഹായിക്കാനും ഭാഷ സമൂഹത്തോടൊപ്പം തമ്മിലുള്ള ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടിയും സഹകര പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ചെറോക്കിയെ കൊണ്ടുപോകുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു നാഷണല്\u200d അമേരിക്കന്\u200d ഭാഷ, ഒരു കേസ് പഠനം ആയ ഭാഷയുടെ ചരിത്രത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് പരിശോധിച്ചശേഷം, ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വിഭവങ്ങളും, നിലവിലുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളും, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d (ചെരോക്കി സമൂഹത്തിന്\u200dറെ അംഗങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം സഹകര ചെരോക്കിയുടെ ഭാഷയുടെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d -ലൂപ് പ്രക്രിസ്സിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് രണ്ട് വഴികള്\u200d സമ്പന്നപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ജോലി ചെയ്യുന്നത് ചെരോക്കിയെക്കുറിച്ച് മാത്രമല്ല എന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപി സമൂഹത്തെ അറിയിക്കാന്\u200d മ', 'mn': 'Дэлхий дээрх хэлний 43%-аас илүү олон хэл аюултай. Одоо хэлний алдагдал дэлхийн болон шинэ колониализм учраас хурдан хурдан гарч ирнэ. Өвдөлтэй хэлнүүдийг хамгаалах, сэргийлэх нь бидний гариг дээрх соёлын олон янз бүрийг хадгалахын тулд маш чухал болсон. Энэ ажил дээр бид NLP хэрхэн аюултай хэлд сэргээх тулд туслах талаар анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид эхлээд NLP мэргэжилтнүүдэд хэл нийгэмд хамтран ойлгох, хамтран ажиллах боломжтой гурван зарчмыг дэмжих боломжтой, NLP хэлний боловсролын тусламжтайгаар туслах гурван аргаар ярилцдаг. Дараа нь бид Чероки, үндсэн Америкийн хэл гэх мэт хатуу аюултай байдаг. Холын түүхийг, хэлний чанарыг, мөн оршин байгаа нөөцийг судалж, бид (Чероки нийгмийн гишүүнтэй хамтран хамтран) NLP мэргэжилтнүүд нийгмийн хамтран хамтран хамтран ажиллаж чадах хэдэн утгатай арга замаар ирсэн. Бид Черокийн хэлний боловсролыг машины дунджаар хөгжүүлэх боломжтой хоёр арга зам зааж, Черокийн нийгмийн хүмүүсийн сонирхолтой олон NLP хэрэгслүүдийг ярилцаж байна. Бид ажил нь зөвхөн NLP нийгмийн тухай Чероки-ын тухай мэдээлэл өгөх биш, мөн ирээдүйн ажлын урам зориг өгөх гэж найдаж байна.', 'mt': "More than 43% of the languages spoken in the world are endangered, and language loss currently occurs at an accelerated rate because of globalization and neocolonialism.  Is-salvataġġ u r-revitalizzazzjoni tal-lingwi mhedda saru importanti ħafna għaż-żamma tad-diversità kulturali fuq il-pjaneta tagħna. F’din il-ħidma, niffokaw fuq id-diskussjoni dwar kif il-NLP tista’ tgħin biex il-lingwi mhedda jerġgħu jiġu ħajjin. L-ewwel nissuġġerixxu tliet prinċipji li jistgħu jgħinu lill-prattikanti tal-NLP biex irawmu fehim reċiproku u kollaborazzjoni mal-komunitajiet tal-lingwi, u niddiskutu tliet modi li bihom il-NLP jista' potenzjalment jassisti fl-edukazzjoni tal-lingwi. We then take Cherokee, a severely-endangered Native American language, as a case study.  After reviewing the language's history, linguistic features, and existing resources, we (in collaboration with Cherokee community members) arrive at a few meaningful ways NLP practitioners can collaborate with community partners.  We suggest two approaches to enrich the Cherokee language's resources with machine-in-the-loop processing, and discuss several NLP tools that people from the Cherokee community have shown interest in.  Nittamaw li l-ħidma tagħna sservi mhux biss biex tinforma lill-komunità tal-NLP dwar Cherokee, iżda wkoll biex tipprovdi ispirazzjoni għal ħidma futura fuq lingwi mhedda b'mod ġenerali.", 'pl': 'Ponad 43% języków używanych na świecie są zagrożone, a utrata języków następuje obecnie w szybszym tempie ze względu na globalizację i neokolonializm. Ratowanie i rewitalizacja języków zagrożonych zagrożeniem stała się bardzo ważna dla utrzymania różnorodności kulturowej na naszej planecie. W niniejszej pracy skupiamy się na omówieniu, w jaki sposób NLP może pomóc w rewitalizacji języków zagrożonych zagrożeniem. Najpierw proponujemy trzy zasady, które mogą pomóc praktykom NLP w promowaniu wzajemnego zrozumienia i współpracy ze społecznościami językowymi, oraz omawiamy trzy sposoby, w jakich NLP może potencjalnie pomóc w edukacji językowej. Następnie bierzemy Cherokee, poważnie zagrożony język rdzennych Amerykanów, jako studium przypadku. Po przejrzeniu historii języka, cech językowych i istniejących zasobów, we współpracy z członkami społeczności Cherokee znajdujemy kilka znaczących sposobów współpracy praktyków NLP z partnerami społeczności. Proponujemy dwa podejścia do wzbogacenia zasobów języka Cherokee o przetwarzanie maszynowe w pętli i omówimy kilka narzędzi NLP, którymi ludzie ze społeczności Cherokee wykazali zainteresowanie. Mamy nadzieję, że nasza praca służy nie tylko informowaniu społeczności NLP o Cherokee, ale także dostarczeniu inspiracji do przyszłych prac nad zagrożonymi językami w ogóle.', 'ro': 'Peste 43% din limbile vorbite în lume sunt pe cale de dispariție, iar pierderea limbii are loc în prezent într-un ritm accelerat din cauza globalizării și neocolonialismului. Salvarea și revitalizarea limbilor pe cale de dispariție a devenit foarte importantă pentru menținerea diversității culturale de pe planeta noastră. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe discutarea modului în care PNL poate ajuta la revitalizarea limbilor pe cale de dispariție. Mai întâi sugerăm trei principii care pot ajuta practicienii PNL să promoveze înțelegerea reciprocă și colaborarea cu comunitățile lingvistice și discutăm trei moduri în care PNL poate contribui potențial la educația lingvistică. Apoi luăm Cherokee, o limbă nativă americană grav pe cale de dispariție, ca studiu de caz. După ce am analizat istoria limbii, caracteristicile lingvistice și resursele existente, noi (în colaborare cu membrii comunității Cherokee) ajungem la câteva moduri semnificative prin care practicienii PNL pot colabora cu partenerii comunității. Sugerăm două abordări pentru a îmbogăți resursele limbii cherokee cu procesarea automată în buclă și discutăm mai multe instrumente NLP pentru care oamenii din comunitatea cherokee au arătat interes. Sperăm că activitatea noastră servește nu numai la informarea comunității PNL despre Cherokee, ci și pentru a oferi inspirație pentru lucrările viitoare privind limbile pe cale de dispariție în general.', 'so': 'Inta ka badan 43% oo luuqadaha dunida lagu hadlo ayaa dhibaato ku leh, oo hadda waxaa dhacda dhibaato la degdego, sababtoo ah globalization iyo neocolonialism. Saving and revitalizing endangered languages has become very important for maintaining the cultural diversity on our planet.  Markaas waxan waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa ka sheekaysanaynaa sida NLP uu u caawinayo in uu dib u celiyo luuqadaha halista ah. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu soo jeedaynaa saddex prinsiyo oo u caawinaya shaqaalaha NLP inay horumariyaan waxgarashada iyo iskala xiriirka bulshada luuqada, waxaynu kala sheekaynaynaa saddex jidood oo ay NLP awoodi karto inuu caawino waxbarashada afka. Markaas waxaynu u qaadannaa Cherokee, afka asalka Amerika oo aad u dhibaataysan, sida waxbarasho xaalad ah. Ka baaraandegista taariikhda luuqada, aqoonta luuqada, iyo maalmaha joogta, waxaynu imaanaynaa (wadajirka iyo xubnaha kooxaha Cherokee) in aad u wadaan karto wadajirka bulshada. Waxaynu soo jeedinaynaa in laba qaabilaad oo ay ku hodansato hantida luqada Cherokee lagu baaraandegayo mashiinka looga baaraandegayo, waxaana kala sheekaynaynaa qalabka NLP oo ay dadka ka mid ah bulshada Cherokee ay xiiseynayaan. Waxaynu rajaynaynaa in shaqadeedu aysan u adeegnayn si aan u ogeysiinno bulshada NLP oo keliya ee ku saabsan Cherokee, laakiin sidoo kale waxaynu u dhiirranaynaa waxyaabaha ku saabsan luuqadaha halista ah.', 'sv': 'Mer än 43% av de språk som talas i världen är hotade, och språkförlusten sker för närvarande i snabbare takt på grund av globalisering och nykolonialism. Att rädda och återuppliva hotade språk har blivit mycket viktigt för att bevara den kulturella mångfalden på vår planet. I detta arbete fokuserar vi på att diskutera hur NLP kan bidra till att vitalisera hotade språk. Vi föreslår först tre principer som kan hjälpa NLP-utövare att främja ömsesidig förståelse och samarbete med språkgemenskaper, och vi diskuterar tre sätt på vilka NLP potentiellt kan hjälpa till med språkundervisning. Vi tar sedan Cherokee, ett allvarligt utrotningshotat indianskt språk, som fallstudie. Efter att ha granskat språkets historia, språkliga funktioner och befintliga resurser, kommer vi (i samarbete med Cherokee community medlemmar) fram till några meningsfulla sätt NLP-utövare kan samarbeta med community partners. Vi föreslår två tillvägagångssätt för att berika cherokee språkets resurser med maskin-in-the-loop bearbetning, och diskutera flera NLP-verktyg som människor från cherokee-samhället har visat intresse för. Vi hoppas att vårt arbete inte bara tjänar till att informera NLP-samhället om cherokee, utan också att ge inspiration till framtida arbete med hotade språk i allmänhet.', 'ta': 'More than 43% of the languages spoken in the world are endangered, and language loss currently occurs at an accelerated rate because of globalization and neocolonialism.  அசுத்தப்பட்ட மொழிகளை சேமித்து மற்றும் மீட்டமைப்பது எங்கள் கிரகத்தில் உள்ள கலாச்சார வேறுபாட்டை பாதுகாக்க இந்த வேலையில், நாம் எப்படி NLP ஆபத்தான மொழிகளை மீட்டெடுக்க உதவ முடியும் என்பதை விளக்கம் செய்கிறோம். முதலில் நாம் மூன்று குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் அது NLP பயிற்சி செய்பவர்களுக்கு உபயோகிக்க உதவும் மொழி சமுதாயத்துடன் ஒருவருக்கொருவர் புரிந்து ப பின்னர் நாம் செரோகி, கடுமையான ஆபத்தான ஒரு நாட்டு அமெரிக்க மொழியை எடுத்து, ஒரு கேஸ் படிப்பாடு என்று. மொழியின் வரலாறு, மொழி குணங்கள் மற்றும் இருக்கும் வளங்களை பார்த்த பிறகு, நாங்கள் (செரோகி சமுதாயத்தின் உறுப்பினர்களுடன் 合作் தில்) சில முறையான வழிகளில் வந்த நாம் செரோகி மொழியின் வளர்ச்சிகளை வளர்ச்சி செய்ய இரண்டு அணுகுகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் இயந்திரம் உள்ள-லூப் செயல்படுத்தல் மற்றும் சில எம்எல்பி கர நாங்கள் நம்முடைய வேலை செயல்படுகிறது என்று நம்புகிறோம் செரோகியை பற்றி மட்டும் அறிவிப்பதற்கு மட்டும் மட்டும் அல்ல, மற்றும் எத', 'ur': 'دنیا میں کلام کی 43% سے زیادہ زبانیں خطرناک ہیں، اور زبان کی خسارہ اکنون ایک سرعت سے ہوتی ہے جہالت اور نئو کالونیائی کی وجہ سے۔ خطرناک زبانوں کو نجات اور دوبارہ زندہ کرنا بہت اہم ہے کہ ہمارے سیارے پر فرهنگی مختلف حفاظت کرنے کے لئے۔ اس کام میں ہم نے NLP کیسے خطرناک زبانوں کو دوبارہ زندہ کرنا مدد کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم پہلی بار تین اصل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو NLP کی تعلیم کرنے والوں کی مدد کر سکتے ہیں کہ زبان جماعتیں کے ساتھ آپس کی سمجھ اور تعلیم کے ساتھ مدد کریں، اور ہم تین طریقے سے بحث کرتے ہیں جس طرح NLP زبان تعلیم میں شامل ہو سکتا ہے۔ پھر ہم چروکیوں کو ایک سخت خطرناک ملک آمریکا زبان بناتے ہیں، ایک کیس تحقیق کے طور پر۔ زبان کی تاریخ، زبان کی تعریفیں اور موجود موجودات کے بارے میں ہم (چروک کی کمیٹی جماعتیوں کے ساتھ) ایک چند معنی طریقے پر پہنچ گئے ہیں جو NLP کارگردان کمیٹی شریکوں کے ساتھ collabora کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم نے چاروکی زبان کے منزلیوں کو ماشین-in-loop پردازی کے ساتھ ثروت کرنے کے لئے دو طریقے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، اور چند NLP ابزار کے بارے میں مشورہ کرتا ہے جن پر چروکی کمونٹی کے لوگوں نے علاقہ دکھایا ہے. ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ ہمارا کام صرف NLP کمونٹی کو چیروکیوں کے بارے میں خبردار کرنے کے لئے نہیں ہے بلکہ مستقبل دنیا کے لئے عمومی خطرناک زبانوں کے بارے میں بھی الهام پیدا کرنے کے لئے بھی ہے.', 'sr': 'Više od 43% jezika koji se govore na svijetu ugrožavaju, a gubitak jezika se trenutno događa ubrzanom stopom zbog globalizacije i neokolonijalizma. Spašavanje i oživljavanje ugroženih jezika postalo je veoma važno za održavanje kulturne raznolikosti na našoj planeti. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na razgovor o tome kako NLP može pomoći da oživi ugrožene jezike. Prvo predlažemo tri principa koji mogu pomoći praktičarima NLP-a da podrže zajedničko razumijevanje i saradnju sa jezičkim zajednicama, i razgovaramo o tri načina na koji NLP može potencijalno pomoći u obrazovanju jezika. Onda ćemo uzeti Cherokee, ozbiljno ugrožen Indijanski jezik, kao studiju slučajeva. Nakon pregledanja istorije jezika, jezičkih karakteristika i postojećih resursa, mi (u saradnji s a članovima zajednice Cherokee) stižemo na nekoliko značajnih načina na koji praktičnici NLP mogu surađivati sa zajedničkim partnerima. Predlažemo dva pristupa da bogatimo resurse Cherokee jezika sa procesom mašine u loopu i razgovaramo o nekoliko NLP alata u kojima su ljudi iz Cherokee zajednice pokazali interes. Nadamo se da naš rad služi ne samo da obavijestimo zajednicu NLP o Cherokeju, nego i da pružimo inspiraciju za budući rad na ugroženim jezicima općenito.', 'si': 'ලෝකයේ කතා කරපු භාෂාවට 43% වඩා වඩා වඩා අනතුරු වෙනවා, භාෂාව නැතිවෙන්නේ ජාතික විශ්වාසය සහ නිවෝකෝලෝනි අපේ ලෝකයේ සංස්කෘතික විවිධානය තියාගන්න සහ ආපහු ආපහු අනතුරු භාෂාවක් බේරගන්න ගොඩක් වැදගත මේ වැඩේ අපි අවධානය කරනවා NLP කොහොමද අනතුරු භාෂාවක් ආපහු පුළුවන් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරධාන තුන්දෙනි ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂකයන්ට උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන් NLP විදියට භාෂාව සමාජයෙන් සමග සහ සහයෝගයක් උදව් කරන්න,  ඊට පස්සේ අපි චෙරෝකි වලට අනතුරු වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, ජාතික ඇමරිකානු භාෂාවක්, කේස් අධ්\u200dයානයක්  භාෂාගේ ඉතිහාසය, භාෂාවික අවස්ථාවය, සහ තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන අවස්ථාවක් පස්සේ, අපි (චෙරෝකි සමාජ සමාජ සමාගම සමඟ සහායෙ අපි කියන්නේ චෙරෝකි භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න, සහ චෙරෝකි සමාජයෙන් ඉන්න මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙනුම අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා අපේ වැඩේ චෙරෝකි ගැන NLP සමාජයට පමණ විතරක් නෙවෙයි නමුත් අනාගතයේ භාෂාවට අනතුරු වැඩේ වැඩ', 'no': 'Meir enn 43 % av språka som vert snakket i verden er ugrozt, og språk er mislukka nå ved ein akselerert rate på grunn av globalisering og neokolonism. Lagring og gjenoppretting av vanskelege språk har blitt veldig viktig for å beholda kulturelle mangfoldet på planeten vår. I denne arbeida har vi fokusert på å diskutera korleis NLP kan hjelpa til å gjenoppretta omsorgde språk. Vi først foreslår tre prinsipper som kan hjelpa NLP-praktiserane for å forstørra sammenheng og samarbeid med språkefellesskap, og vi diskuterer tre måtar NLP kan potensielt hjelpa i språkeutdanning. Vi tar derfor Cherokee, ein vanskelig vanskeleg amerikansk språk, som tilfeldige studier. Etter å gjera omsyning av språkehistorien, språkefunksjonar og eksisterande ressursar, kommer vi (i samarbeid med Cherokee-medlemmer) på noen betydelige måtar NLP-praktiserane kan samarbeide med samarbeidsgiver. Vi foreslår to tilnærmingar for å rykke ressursane til Cherokee-språket med maskinen-i-loop-handsaming, og diskuterer fleire NLP-verktøy som folk frå Cherokee-samfunnet har vist interesse i. Vi håper at arbeidet vårt serverer ikkje bare for å informere NLP-samfunnet om Cherokee, men også for å gi inspirasjon for framtidige arbeid på vanskelege språk generelt.', 'vi': 'Nhiều hơn 43 phần ngôn ngữ được nói trên thế giới đang bị đe dọa, và sự mất ngôn ngữ hiện tại đang bắt đầu với tốc độ nhanh chóng do nền kinh tế và tân thuộc. Tiết kiệm và tái tạo lại các ngôn ngữ đang gặp nguy hiểm trở nên rất quan trọng để bảo vệ sự đa dạng văn hóa trên hành tinh chúng ta. Trong công việc này, chúng ta tập trung vào việc bàn bạc làm thế nào chọc giận ngôn ngữ bị đe dọa. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi đề xuất ba nguyên tắc có thể giúp các chuyên gia chọc dò tủy sống phát triển sự hiểu biết lẫn phối hợp với các cộng đồng ngôn ngữ, và chúng tôi thảo luận ba cách để Đảng NLP có thể trợ giúp trong giáo dục ngôn ngữ. Chúng ta sẽ lấy Cherokee, một ngôn ngữ bản địa Mỹ bị đe dọa nghiêm trọng, làm một trường hợp nghiên cứu. Sau khi xem lại lịch s ử ngôn ngữ, các tính năng ngôn ngữ, và nguồn lực hiện tại, chúng tôi (cùng các thành viên Hồng Kông) tìm ra cách hợp tác với cộng đồng. Chúng tôi đề nghị hai phương pháp làm giàu tài nguyên của ngôn ngữ Cherokee bằng máy móc đang được xử lý, và thảo luận về một s ố công cụ NLP mà người từ cộng đồng Cherokee đã thể hiện sự quan tâm. Chúng tôi hy vọng rằng công việc của chúng tôi không chỉ để thông báo cho cộng đồng New York về Cherokee, mà còn là để tạo cảm hứng cho công việc tương lai trên các ngôn ngữ đang gặp nguy hiểm.', 'uz': "Dunyoda gapiradigan tillardan 43% dan ortiq narsa yo'q, va hozirda o'z tili globalization va nekolonialism sababda tezlashtirilgan foydalanadi. Joylangan tillarni saqlash va qaytarishni saqlash eng muhim bo'lgan dunyodagi madaniyatning tenglarini davom etish uchun. Bu ishda, biz NLP qanday xavfsiz tillarni qayta qayta chiqarishga yordam berishiga foydalanamiz. Birinchi so'zda, NLP ta'minlovchilariga birlashtirish va tillar jamiyatlari bilan birlashtirish va birlashtirishni yordam berishi mumkin, biz uchta yo'l bilan ajratish uchun NLP ta'lim ta'limga yordam beradi. Keyin biz cherokeeni bir kashfa o'qituvchi davlat bo'lgan cherokeeni o'rganamiz. Tilning tarixini ko'rib chiqishdan keyin, tillar, tillar imkoniyatlarini va mavjud rasmlarni ko'rib turganimiz, biz (Cherokee jamiyatlari bilan birlashtirishda) bir necha ma'lum narsalardan NLP ishga tushiruvchilar jamiyat bilan birlashtirishga ishlashi mumkin. Biz Cherokee tilining manbalarini o'zgartirish uchun ikki tilni boshqarish imkoniyatlarini o'zgartirib chiqarishimiz va Cherokee jamiyatidagi odamlar qiziqarishga ega bo'lgan bir necha NLP asboblarini talab qilamiz. Biz ishimiz Cherokee haqida faqat NLP jamiyatini hamma narsa berish uchun xizmat qilamiz, balki kelajak o'zlari haqida xavfsiz qiladigan ishni o'zgartiradi.", 'bg': 'Повече от 43% от езиците, говорени в света, са застрашени, а загубата на езици понастоящем се случва с ускорена скорост поради глобализацията и неоколониализма. Спасяването и съживяването на застрашените езици стана много важно за поддържането на културното разнообразие на нашата планета. В тази работа се фокусираме върху обсъждането как НЛП може да помогне за съживяването на застрашените езици. Първо предлагаме три принципа, които могат да помогнат на практикуващите НЛП да насърчават взаимното разбирателство и сътрудничество с езиковите общности, и обсъждаме три начина, по които НЛП потенциално може да помогне в езиковото образование. След това вземаме Чероки, силно застрашен индийски език, като пример. След като прегледаме историята на езика, езиковите особености и съществуващите ресурси, ние (в сътрудничество с членовете на общността) достигаме до няколко смислени начина, по които практикуващите НЛП могат да си сътрудничат с партньорите на общността. Предлагаме два подхода за обогатяване на ресурсите на черокия език с обработка машина в цикъла и обсъждаме няколко инструмента за НЛП, към които хората от чероките общности са проявили интерес. Надяваме се, че работата ни служи не само за информиране на общността на НЛП за чероки, но и за вдъхновение за бъдеща работа по застрашените езици като цяло.', 'hr': 'Više od 43% jezika koji se govore na svijetu ugrožavaju, a gubitak jezika trenutno se događa ubrzanom stopom zbog globalizacije i neokolonijalizma. Spašavanje i oživljavanje ugroženih jezika postalo je vrlo važno za održavanje kulturne raznolikosti na našoj planeti. U ovom poslu, usredotočili smo se na razgovor o tome kako NLP može pomoći oživljavati ugrožene jezike. Prvo predlažemo tri načela koje mogu pomoći praktičarima NLP-a da podržavaju zajedničko razumijevanje i saradnju s jezičkim zajednicama, i razgovaramo o tri načina na koji NLP može potencijalno pomoći u obrazovanju jezika. Onda ćemo uzeti Cherokee, ozbiljno ugrožen američki jezik, kao studiju slučajeva. Nakon pregledanja povijesti jezika, jezičkih karakteristika i postojećih resursa, mi (u saradnji s članovima zajednice Cherokee) stižemo na nekoliko značajnih način a na koji praktičnici NLP-a mogu surađivati s zajedničkim partnerima. Predlažemo dva pristupa bogatim resursima jezika Cherokee s obrazovanjem strojeva i razgovaramo o nekoliko NLP alata u kojima su ljudi iz Cherokee zajednice pokazali interes. Nadamo se da naš rad služi ne samo da obavijestimo zajednicu NLP o Cherokeeu, nego i da pružimo inspiraciju za budući rad na ugroženim jezicima općenito.', 'da': 'Mere end 43% af de sprog, der tales i verden, er truet, og sprogtab sker i øjeblikket i stigende grad på grund af globalisering og neokolonialisme. At redde og genoplive truede sprog er blevet meget vigtigt for at bevare den kulturelle mangfoldighed på vores planet. I dette arbejde fokuserer vi på at diskutere, hvordan NLP kan hjælpe med at genoplive truede sprog. Vi foreslår først tre principper, der kan hjælpe NLP-praktikere med at fremme gensidig forståelse og samarbejde med sprogsamfund, og vi diskuterer tre måder, hvorpå NLP potentielt kan hjælpe med sprogundervisning. Vi tager derefter Cherokee, et alvorligt truet indiansk sprog, som case study. Efter at have gennemgået sprogets historie, sproglige funktioner og eksisterende ressourcer, når vi (i samarbejde med Cherokee-fællesskabets medlemmer) frem til et par meningsfulde måder, hvorpå NLP-udøvere kan samarbejde med fællesskabspartnere. Vi foreslår to tilgange til at berige cherokee sprogets ressourcer med machine-in-the-loop behandling, og diskutere flere NLP-værktøjer, som folk fra cherokee samfundet har vist interesse i. Vi håber, at vores arbejde ikke kun tjener til at informere NLP-fællesskabet om cherokee, men også til at give inspiration til det fremtidige arbejde med truede sprog generelt.', 'de': 'Mehr als 43% der weltweit gesprochenen Sprachen sind gefährdet, und der Sprachverlust tritt derzeit aufgrund der Globalisierung und des Neokolonialismus beschleunigt auf. Die Rettung und Wiederbelebung bedrohter Sprachen ist für die Erhaltung der kulturellen Vielfalt auf unserem Planeten sehr wichtig geworden. In dieser Arbeit konzentrieren wir uns darauf, wie NLP helfen kann, gefährdete Sprachen wiederzubeleben. Zunächst schlagen wir drei Prinzipien vor, die NLP-Praktikern helfen können, gegenseitiges Verständnis und Zusammenarbeit mit Sprachgemeinschaften zu fördern, und wir diskutieren drei Möglichkeiten, wie NLP potenziell bei der Sprachbildung helfen kann. Als Fallstudie nehmen wir dann Cherokee, eine stark gefährdete Sprache der amerikanischen Ureinwohner. Nachdem wir die Geschichte der Sprache, sprachliche Merkmale und vorhandene Ressourcen überprüft haben, finden wir (in Zusammenarbeit mit Cherokee-Community-Mitgliedern) einige sinnvolle Möglichkeiten, NLP-Praktiker mit Community-Partnern zusammenzuarbeiten. Wir schlagen zwei Ansätze vor, um die Ressourcen der Cherokee-Sprache mit Machine-in-the-Loop-Verarbeitung zu bereichern, und diskutieren mehrere NLP-Tools, an denen Menschen aus der Cherokee-Community Interesse gezeigt haben. Wir hoffen, dass unsere Arbeit nicht nur dazu dient, die NLP-Community über Cherokee zu informieren, sondern auch Inspiration für zukünftige Arbeiten zu gefährdeten Sprachen im Allgemeinen bietet.', 'ko': '세계에서 43%가 넘는 언어가 위기에 처해 있으며 글로벌화와 신식민주의로 언어 유실 속도가 빨라지고 있다.멸종 위기 언어를 구하고 진흥시키는 것은 지구상의 문화 다양성을 유지하는 데 매우 중요하다.이 작업에서 우리는 NLP가 멸종 위기 언어의 부흥을 어떻게 돕는지 중점적으로 토론한다.우리는 먼저 NLP 실천자들이 언어 커뮤니티와의 상호 이해와 협력을 촉진하는 데 도움을 줄 수 있는 세 가지 원칙을 제시했고 NLP가 언어 교육에 도움이 될 수 있는 세 가지 방식도 논의했다.그리고 우리는 체로키어를 사례 연구로 삼아 체로키어는 심각한 위험에 처한 아메리카 원주민 언어이다.이 언어의 역사, 언어 특징과 기존 자원을 되돌아본 후에 우리(체노키 지역사회 구성원과 협력)는 NLP 종사자와 지역사회 합작 파트너가 협력하는 의미 있는 방식을 얻었다.우리는 기계를 통해 순환 처리를 통해 체노키 언어 자원을 풍부하게 하는 두 가지 방법을 제시했고, 체노키 지역사회 사람들이 흥미를 느끼는 몇 가지 NLP 도구를 토론했다.우리는 우리의 업무가 NLP 지역사회에 체노키어를 이해할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 미래의 멸종 위기 언어 연구에 계발을 제공할 수 있기를 바란다.', 'nl': 'Meer dan 43% van de talen die in de wereld gesproken worden, zijn bedreigd en taalverlies gebeurt momenteel in een versneld tempo als gevolg van globalisering en neokolonialisme. Het redden en revitaliseren van bedreigde talen is erg belangrijk geworden voor het behoud van de culturele diversiteit op onze planeet. In dit werk bespreken we hoe NLP bedreigde talen kan helpen revitaliseren. We stellen eerst drie principes voor die NLP-beoefenaars kunnen helpen om wederzijds begrip en samenwerking met taalgemeenschappen te bevorderen, en we bespreken drie manieren waarop NLP potentieel kan helpen bij taalonderwijs. We nemen dan Cherokee, een ernstig bedreigde inheemse Amerikaanse taal, als case study. Na het bekijken van de geschiedenis van de taal, taalkundige kenmerken en bestaande bronnen, komen we (in samenwerking met leden van de Cherokee-gemeenschap) tot een paar zinvolle manieren waarop NLP-beoefenaars kunnen samenwerken met gemeenschapspartners. We stellen twee benaderingen voor om de bronnen van de Cherokee taal te verrijken met machine-in-the-loop verwerking, en bespreken verschillende NLP tools waar mensen uit de Cherokee gemeenschap interesse in hebben getoond. We hopen dat ons werk niet alleen dient om de NLP-gemeenschap te informeren over Cherokee, maar ook om inspiratie te geven voor toekomstig werk aan bedreigde talen in het algemeen.', 'sw': 'Zaidi ya asilimia 43 ya lugha zinazozungumzwa duniani zinahatarishwa, na hasara ya lugha kwa sasa inatokea kwa kiwango cha kasi kwa sababu ya ulimwengu na ukoloni. Kuokoa na kuharibu lugha za hatari zimekuwa muhimu kwa kuendeleza utofauti wa kiutamaduni katika dunia yetu. Katika kazi hii, tunalenga kujadili jinsi NLP inavyoweza kusaidia kurekebisha lugha zinazohatarishwa. Kwanza tunapendekeza kanuni tatu ambazo zinaweza kuwasaidia wataalam wa NLP kuwasaidia kukuza uelewa wa moja kwa moja na ushirikiano na jamii za lugha, na tunajadili njia tatu ambazo NLP inaweza kusaidia elimu ya lugha. Kisha tunachukua Cherokee, lugha ya asili ya Marekani yenye hatari kubwa, kama utafiti wa kesi. Baada ya kuangalia historia ya lugha hiyo, vipengele vya lugha, na rasilimali zilizopo, sisi (kwa ushirikiano na wanachama wa Cherokee) tunafika katika njia chache yenye maana yanayomaanisha wataalamu wa NLP wanaweza kushiriki na washirika wa jamii. Tunawapendekeza mbili za kutajirisha rasilimali za lugha ya Cherokee kwa kutumia mbinu za upasuaji wa mashine, na kujadili zana kadhaa za NLP ambazo watu wa jamii ya Cherokee wamekuwa wakivutiwa. Tunatumaini kwamba kazi yetu haitoi tu kuwasilisha jumuiya ya NLP kuhusu Cherokee, bali pia kutoa hamasa kwa ajili ya kazi za baadaye kuhusu lugha zinazohatarishwa kwa ujumla.', 'fa': 'بیشتر از 43 درصد زبانی که در دنیا صحبت می\u200cشود در خطر می\u200cشوند، و در حال حاضر خسارت زبانی به سرعت سرعت می\u200cرسد به دلیل جهانی\u200cسازی و نئو\u200cکالونیزی. نجات و دوباره زنده کردن زبانهای خطرناک برای حفظ تنوع فرهنگی روی سیاره ما خیلی مهم شده است. در این کار، ما تمرکز می کنیم روی بحث کردن که NLP چگونه می تواند به دوباره زنده کردن زبانهای خطرناک کمک کند. اول ما سه اصول را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که ممکن است کمک کنند کارگران NLP تا توسعه درک و همکاری با جامعه\u200cهای زبان\u200cها را افزایش دهند و در سه راه بحث کنیم که NLP ممکن است در آموزش زبان کمک کند. سپس به عنوان یک مطالعه پرونده شروکی، زبان آمریکایی که به شدت خطرناک است، به عنوان یک مطالعه پرونده می گیریم. بعد از تحقیق تاریخ زبان، ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و منابع موجود، ما (در همکاری با اعضای جامعه\u200cهای شروکی) به چند راه معنی می\u200cرسیم که کارگران NLP می\u200cتوانند با شریکان جامعه همکاری کنند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم دو دسترسی برای ثروت منابع زبان چروکی با پرداخت ماشین\u200cهای داخل چرخه، و در مورد چند ابزار NLP صحبت کنیم که مردم از جامعه چروکی علاقه دارند. ما امیدواریم که کار ما فقط برای اطلاعات اجتماعی NLP در مورد چروکی خدمت می\u200cکند، بلکه برای تحویل الهام برای کار آینده در زبانهای خطرناک در کل ارائه می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "meer as 43% van die taal wat in die wêreld gespreek is, is gevaar, en taal verloor word huidiglik by 'n versnellige tempo vanweë globalisering en neokolonialisme. Stoor en herstel gevaardige tale het baie belangrik geword vir die onderhou van die kulturele verskeidigheid op ons planeet. In hierdie werk, ons fokus op die bespreek van hoe NLP kan help om gevaardige tale te herstel. Ons voorstel eerste drie prinsipels wat NLP-praktisers kan help om gemeenskaplike verstanding en samarbeid te versterk met taal gemeenskappe, en ons bespreek drie maniere waarin NLP potensieel kan help in taal-opvoeding. Ons neem dan Cherokee, 'n groot gevaardige Natiewe Amerikaanse taal as 'n geval studie. Na die oorskou van die taal se geskiedenis, lingwisiese funksies en bestaande hulpbronne, kom ons (in samarbeid met Cherokee gemeenskap lede) op 'n paar betekende maniere wat NLP-praktisers kan saamstaan met gemeenskap-partnere. Ons bevestig twee toegang om die Cherokee taal se hulpbronne te ryk met masjien-in-die-loop-prosessering en bespreek verskeie NLP nutsprogramme wat mense van die Cherokee gemeenskap belang het in. Ons hoop dat ons werk nie net om die NLP gemeenskap oor Cherokee te kennis nie, maar ook om inspirasie te verskaf vir toekomstige werk op gevaardige tale in algemeen.", 'id': 'Lebih dari 43% dari bahasa yang dibicarakan di dunia terancam, dan kehilangan bahasa saat ini terjadi dengan kadar yang dipercepat karena globalisasi dan neokolonialisme. Menyelamatkan dan menghidupkan bahasa berbahaya telah menjadi sangat penting untuk mempertahankan diversitas budaya di planet kita. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita fokus pada mendiskusikan bagaimana NLP dapat membantu menghidupkan kembali bahasa berbahaya. Kami pertama-tama menyarankan tiga prinsip yang dapat membantu praktek NLP untuk mendorong pemahaman dan kolaborasi antara satu sama lain dengan komunitas bahasa, dan kami mendiskusikan tiga cara NLP potensial dapat membantu dalam pendidikan bahasa. We then take Cherokee, a severely-endangered Native American language, as a case study.  Setelah meninjau sejarah bahasa, ciri-ciri bahasa, dan sumber daya yang ada, kami (dalam kolaborasi dengan anggota komunitas Cherokee) tiba pada beberapa cara yang berarti para praktek NLP dapat bekerja sama dengan rekan komunitas. Kami menyarankan dua pendekatan untuk memperkaya sumber daya bahasa Cherokee dengan proses mesin-dalam-loop, dan mendiskusikan beberapa alat NLP yang orang-orang dari komunitas Cherokee telah menunjukkan minat. We hope that our work serves not only to inform the NLP community about Cherokee, but also to provide inspiration for future work on endangered languages in general.', 'sq': 'Më tepër se 43% e gjuhëve të folura në botë janë në rrezik dhe humbja e gjuhës ndodh aktualisht me një normë të përshpejtuar për shkak të globalizimit dhe neokolonialismit. Shpëtimi dhe ringjallja e gjuhëve të rrezikuara është bërë shumë i rëndësishëm për ruajtjen e diversitetit kulturor në planetin tonë. Në këtë punë, ne përqëndrohemi në diskutimin se si NLP mund të ndihmojë ringjalljen e gjuhëve të rrezikuara. Ne së pari sugjerojmë tre parime që mund të ndihmojnë praktikantët e NLP për të nxitur kuptimin e ndërsjelltë dhe bashkëpunimin me komunitetet gjuhësore dhe diskutojmë tre mënyra në të cilat NLP mund të ndihmojë potencialisht në arsimin e gjuhëve. Pastaj marrim Cherokee, një gjuhë amerikane me rrezik të rëndë, si një studim rasti. Pas shqyrtimit të historisë s ë gjuhës, karakteristikave gjuhësore dhe burimeve ekzistuese, ne (në bashkëpunim me anëtarët e komunitetit të Çerokit) arrijmë në disa mënyra të kuptueshme që praktikantët e NLP mund të bashkëpunojnë me partnerët e komunitetit. Ne sugjerojmë dy qasje për të pasuruar burimet e gjuhës Çeroki me procesimin e makinës-në-loop dhe të diskutojmë disa mjete NLP në të cilat njerëzit nga komuniteti Çeroki kanë treguar interes. Ne shpresojmë se puna jonë shërben jo vetëm për të informuar komunitetin e NLP rreth Çerokit, por gjithashtu për të ofruar frymëzim për punën e ardhshme në gjuhët e rrezikuara në përgjithësi.', 'tr': 'Dünýäde gürleýän dillerin 43% köpüsi tehlikede ýok bolýar, we şu wagt dillerin ýitilmesi globalizasyon we neokoloniýalyzmyň sebäbi häzirki ýuwaşlykda bolýar. Güregimizde dürli dilleri gaýd etmek we täzeden öwrülmek mümkin boldy. Bu işde NLP-iň nähili güýçli dillerini täzeden geçirmäge kömek edip biljekdigini gürrüň bermek üçin üns berýäris. Biz ilkinji gezek NLP praktikantlaryna adalatma we dil jemgyýetleri bilen bir-birleşmegi kömek etmek üçin üç prinsipi teklip edip bilýäris we ol üçin NLP dil bilimi bilen kömek edip bilýän üç ýoly gürrüň edip bilýäris. Soňra biz Çeroki dilini örän tehlikeli hasaplanýan ýerli Amerikanyň dilini tapdyk. Dil taryhyny bejerenden soň, lingwistiki özellikleri we bar çeşmeleri, biz (Cherokee toplumyň üýtgenleri bilen işbirleşip) NLP praktikantlaryň toplumyň ortaklary bilen bir näçe wajyp ýolyna gelip bileris. Çeroki dilleriniň maşynda işleýän guramlary bilen baglanmagy üçin iki golaýy teklip edýäris we Cherokeiň adamlarynyň gyzyklandygyny görkezýän NLP araçlaryny we gürrüň edýäris. Çalışmalarymyz diňe NLP jemgyýetimizi Cherokee barada habarlamak üçin däl, ýöne gelejekde işimizi umumy tegribe edilen dillerde hem ünsümi bermek üçin hökman edýäris diýip umyt edýäris.', 'am': 'በዓለም የሚናገሩ ቋንቋዎች ከ43 በመቶ የሚበልጡ ደንግጠኞች ናቸው፣ ቋንቋውም አሁን በዓለምአቀፍ እና በኒኮሎonialism ምክንያት ፍጥረት የሚነካው ፍጥረት ነው፡፡ በአደቃቂው ቋንቋዎች በማስቀመጥ እና ማደጋገፍ በዓለም ላይ የባሕል ልዩነት ለመጠበቅ እጅግ muhimu ሆነዋል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የNLP ቋንቋዎችን እንዴት ሊደነግፍ እንደሚችል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ ሦስት የNLP ባለሞራተኞች የቋንቋ አካባቢዎችን ማስተዋል እና ትጋርማቸዋለን ብለን እናስረዳለን፤ በቋንቋም ትምህርት የሚችሉበትን ሦስት መንገዶች እናጋራለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የሕዝብ አሜሪካዊ ቋንቋ የቻሮክይ ትምህርት መሆኑን እንወስዳለን፡፡ የቋንቋውን ታሪክ፣ የቋንቋው ግንኙነት እና የአሁኑ ሀብት፣ እኛ (ከCherokee ማኅበረሰብ አባላት ጋር አብረው) እናደርጋለን፡፡ የኬሮክይ ቋንቋ ሀብትን በመጠቀም እናስባለን፣ ከክሮክይ ማኅበረሰብ ሰዎች የሚጠቅሙትን በብዙ የNLP መሣሪያዎች እናጋራለን፡፡ ሥራችን የNLP ማኅበረሰብ በቻሮኪ ላይ ማወቅ ብቻ ሳይሆን ተስፋ እናደርጋለን፣ ነገር ግን ለኋለኛው ቋንቋዎች በተደነገገ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ለማስታወቂያ ለማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'More than 43% of the languages spoken in the world are endangered, and language loss currently occurs at an accelerated rate because of globalization and neocolonialism.  Խտանգված լեզուների փրկելը և վերականգնումը շատ կարևոր դարձավ մեր մոլորակի մշակութային բազմազանությունը պահպանելու համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կենտրոնանում ենք քննարկելու վրա, թե ինչպես է ՆԼՊ-ը կարող օգնել վերականգնել վտանգված լեզուները: Սկզբում մենք առաջարկում ենք երեք սկզբունք, որոնք կարող են օգնել ՆԼՊ-ի մասնագետներին խրախուսել լեզվի համայնքների հետ փոխադարձ հասկացությունը և համագործակցությունը, և մենք քննարկում ենք երեք միջոց, որոնց միջոցով ՆԼՊ- Այնուհետև մենք ընդունում ենք Չերոկին, մի լուրջ վտանգված մայրիկ ամերիկյան լեզու, որպես դեպքերի ուսումնասիրություն: Երբ վերանայեցինք լեզվի պատմությունը, լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունները և գոյություն ունեցող ռեսուրսները, մենք (համագործակցելով Չերոկի համայնքի անդամների հետ) հասանք մի քանի իմաստալից միջոցներին, որոնց միջոցով կարող են համագործակցել ՆԼՊ-ի Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու մոտեցում, որպեսզի հարստացնենք Չերոկի լեզվի ռեսուրսները մեքենայի-շրջանակի վերլուծությամբ և քննարկենք մի քանի ՆԼՊ գործիքներ, որոնց հետաքրքրված են Չերոկի համայնքից մարդիկ: Մենք հույս ունենք, որ մեր աշխատանքը ծառայում է ոչ միայն Չերոկի մասին տեղեկացնելու համար ՆԼՊ-ի համայնքին, այլ նաև ոգեշնչելու համար ապագա աշխատանքը վտանգված լեզուների վրա ընդհանուր առմամբ:', 'az': "Dünyada danışan dillərin 43%-indən artıq təhlükəsizlik edir, dillərin zərəri globalizasyon və neokolonilizm üzündən tezliklə gəlir. Qorxulmuş dilləri qurtarmaq və yenidən diriltmək planetimizdə kültür müxtəlifliyini qorumaq üçün çox vacib oldu. Bu işdə NLP təhlükəsizli dilləri yenidən diriltməyə kömək edə biləcəyi ilə danışmağa başladıq. Biz ilk dəfə NLP təhsil edənlərin dil toplumları ilə birlikdə anlaşılmağa və işbirliğin ə kömək etməsinə kömək edəcək üç nəticə təklif edirik və NLP dil təhsil etməsinə mümkün olaraq yardım edəcək üç nəticə ilə mübahisə edirik. Sonra biz Cherokee'yi, çox tehlikeli bir yerli Amerikan dilini, məsələlər təhsil etdik. Dilin keçmişini, dillərin özelliklərini və mövcud resurslarını inceledikdən sonra, biz (Cherokee toplum üyeləri ilə birlikdə) NLP təhsil edənləri toplum ortaqları ilə birlikdə olaraq bəzi anlamlı yollara gəldik. Biz Cherokee dilinin maşın-in-loop işləməsi ilə qazanmaq üçün iki yaxınlıq təklif edirik və Cherokee toplumundan insanların interesi göstərdiyi NLP vasitəsilə mübahisə edirik. Biz ümid edirik ki, işlərimiz ancaq NLP toplumuna Cherokee haqqında xəbər vermək üçün deyil, ancaq təhlükəsizli dillərdə gələcək işlərə də ilham vermək üçün istifadə edir.", 'bn': 'More than 43% of the languages spoken in the world are endangered, and language loss currently occurs at an accelerated rate because of globalization and neocolonialism.  আমাদের পৃথিবীতে সাংস্কৃতিক বৈচিত্র্য ধরে রাখার জন্য বিপদজনক ভাষা সংরক্ষণ এবং পুনরুদ্ধার করা খুব গুরুত্বপূ এই কাজে আমরা মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি কিভাবে এনএলপি বিপদজনক ভাষাকে পুনরুদ্ধার করতে সাহায্য করতে পারে। আমরা প্রথমে তিনটি নীতি পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি যারা এনএলপি প্রশিক্ষকদের সাহায্য করতে পারে যে ভাষার সম্প্রদায়ের সাথে বিভিন্ন বুদ্ধি ও সহযোগিতা তুল তারপর আমরা চেরোকিকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিপদজনক একটি নাগরিক আমেরিকান ভাষা হিসেবে নিয়ে যাই। ভাষার ইতিহাস, ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং বিদ্যমান সম্পদ পর্যবেক্ষণের পরে আমরা (চেরোকি সম্প্রদায়ের সদস্যদের সাথে সহযোগিতায়) কয়েকটি অর্থপূর্ণ উপায়ে এসেছি এনএলপি  আমরা চেরোকি ভাষার সম্পদ সমৃদ্ধ করার দুটি উপায় পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি মেশিন-ইন-লুপ প প্রক্রিয়া দিয়ে এবং বেশ কয়েকটি এনএলপি টুল নিয়ে আলোচনা করি যে চেরোকি সম্প্রদ আমরা আশা করি যে আমাদের কাজ শুধুমাত্র এনএলপি সম্প্রদায়কে চেরোকি সম্পর্কে জানাতে পারে না, বরং সাধারণ ভাষায় বিপদজনক ভাষায় ভবিষ্', 'bs': 'Više od 43% jezika koji se govore na svijetu ugrožavaju, a gubitak jezika trenutno se događa ubrzanom stopom zbog globalizacije i neokolonijalizma. Spašavanje i oživljavanje ugroženih jezika postalo je veoma važno za održavanje kulturne raznolikosti na našoj planeti. U ovom poslu, fokusiramo se na razgovor o tome kako NLP može pomoći da oživi ugrožene jezike. Prvo predlažemo tri principa koji mogu pomoći praktičnicima NLP-a da podržavaju međusobno razumijevanje i saradnju sa jezičkim zajednicama, i razgovaramo o tri načina na koji NLP može potencijalno pomoći u obrazovanju jezika. Onda ćemo uzeti Cherokee, ozbiljno ugrožen Indijanski jezik, kao studiju slučajeva. Nakon pregledanja povijesti jezika, jezičkih karakteristika i postojećih resursa, mi (u saradnji s a članovima zajednice Cherokee) stižemo na nekoliko značajnih načina na koji praktičari NLP mogu surađivati sa zajedničkim partnerima. Predlažemo dva pristupa da bogatimo resurse Cherokee jezika sa procesom mašine u loopu i razgovaramo o nekoliko NLP alata u kojima su ljudi iz Cherokee zajednice pokazali interes. Nadamo se da naš rad služi ne samo da obavijestimo zajednicu NLP o Cherokeeu, već i da pružimo inspiraciju za budući rad na ugroženim jezicima u općenitom.', 'cs': 'Více než 43% jazyků hovořících ve světě jsou ohroženy a jazykové ztráty v současné době dochází zrychleným tempem kvůli globalizaci a neokolonialismu. Záchrana a revitalizace ohrožených jazyků se stala velmi důležitým pro zachování kulturní rozmanitosti na naší planetě. V této práci se zaměřujeme na diskusi o tom, jak NLP může pomoci revitalizovat ohrožené jazyky. Nejprve navrhujeme tři principy, které mohou pomoci pracovníkům NLP podporovat vzájemné porozumění a spolupráci s jazykovými komunitami, a diskutujeme tři způsoby, jak NLP může potenciálně pomoci při jazykovém vzdělávání. Jako případovou studii vezmeme Cherokee, vážně ohrožený indický jazyk. Po přezkoumání historie jazyka, jazykových rysů a stávajících zdrojů jsme (ve spolupráci s členy komunity Cherokee) přišli na několik smysluplných způsobů, jak mohou pracovníci NLP spolupracovat s partnery komunity. Navrhujeme dva přístupy k obohacení zdrojů jazyka Cherokee o strojové zpracování ve smyčce a diskutujeme několik NLP nástrojů, o které lidé z komunity Cherokee projevili zájem. Doufáme, že naše práce slouží nejen k informování NLP komunity o Cherokee, ale také k inspiraci pro budoucí práci na ohrožených jazycích obecně.', 'et': 'Üle 43% maailmas räägitavatest keeltest on ohus ning keelekaotus toimub praegu kiiremini globaliseerumise ja neokolonialismi tõttu. Ohustatud keelte päästmine ja taaselustamine on muutunud väga oluliseks meie planeedi kultuurilise mitmekesisuse säilitamiseks. Selles töös keskendume arutelule, kuidas NLP võib aidata elustada ohustatud keeli. Esiteks pakume välja kolm põhimõtet, mis võivad aidata NLP praktikutel edendada vastastikust mõistmist ja koostööd keelekogukondadega, ning arutame kolme viisi, kuidas NLP võib potentsiaalselt aidata keeleõppes. Seejärel võtame tšerokee, tõsiselt ohustatud Ameerika põlisrahvaste keele juhtumi uuringuna. Pärast keele ajaloo, keeleliste omaduste ja olemasolevate ressursside läbivaatamist jõuame (koostöös Cherokee kogukonna liikmetega) mõnele mõttekale viisile, kuidas NLP praktikud saavad kogukonna partneritega koostööd teha. Soovitame kahte lähenemisviisi tšerokee keele ressursside rikastamiseks masin-in-the-loop töötlemisega ning arutame mitmeid NLP tööriistu, mille vastu tšerokee kogukonna inimesed on huvi näidanud. Loodame, et meie töö ei aita mitte ainult teavitada NLP kogukonda cherokeest, vaid ka anda inspiratsiooni tulevaseks tööks ohustatud keeltega üldiselt.', 'fi': 'Yli 43% maailman puhutuista kielistä on uhanalaisia, ja kielten menetys tapahtuu tällä hetkellä kiihtyvää vauhtia globalisaation ja uuskolonialismin vuoksi. Uhanalaisten kielten pelastamisesta ja elvyttämisestä on tullut erittäin tärkeää maapallon kulttuurisen monimuotoisuuden säilyttämiseksi. Tässä työssä keskitytään keskustelemaan siitä, miten NLP voi auttaa elvyttämään uhanalaisia kieliä. Ehdotamme ensin kolmea periaatetta, jotka voivat auttaa NLP-ammattilaisia edistämään keskinäistä ymmärrystä ja yhteistyötä kieliyhteisöjen kanssa, ja keskustelemme kolmesta tavasta, joilla NLP voi mahdollisesti auttaa kieltenopetuksessa. Sitten otamme tapaustutkimuksena Cherokeen, vakavasti uhanalaisen intiaanin kielen. Tarkasteltuamme kielen historiaa, kielellisiä ominaisuuksia ja olemassa olevia resursseja (yhteistyössä Cherokee-yhteisön jäsenten kanssa) löydämme muutamia merkityksellisiä tapoja, joilla NLP-ammattilaiset voivat tehdä yhteistyötä yhteisön kumppanien kanssa. Ehdotamme kahta tapaa rikastuttaa cherokeen kielen resursseja konesilmukan prosessoinnilla ja keskustelemme useista NLP-työkaluista, joista cherokee-yhteisön ihmiset ovat osoittaneet kiinnostusta. Toivomme, että työmme ei palvele ainoastaan tiedottamista cherokeesta NLP-yhteisölle, vaan myös innostaa tulevaa työtä uhanalaisten kielten parissa yleensä.', 'ca': "Més del 43% de les llengües parlades al món estan en perill, i actualment la pèrdua de llengües es produeix a un ritme accelerat a causa de la globalització i el neocolonialisme. Salvar i revitalitzar les llengües en perill s'ha convertit en molt important per mantenir la diversitat cultural del nostre planeta. En aquest treball, ens centrem en discutir com la NLP pot ajudar a revitalitzar les llengües en perill. Primer suggerem tres principis que poden ajudar els practicants de la NLP a fomentar la comprensió mutua i la col·laboració amb les comunitats lingüístices, i discutem tres maneres de com la NLP pot ajudar potencialment en l'educació lingüística. Llavors agafem Cherokee, una llengua nativa americana seriament amenaçada, com a estudi de cas. Després de revisar la història de la llengua, les característiques lingüístices i els recursos existents, nosaltres (en col·laboració amb els membres de la comunitat de Cherokee) arribem a algunes maneres significatives que els practicants de la NLP poden col·laborar amb parelles de la comunitat. Sugirem dos enfocaments per enriquecer els recursos del llenguatge de Cherokee amb processament de màquina en bucle, i discutir diverses eines del NLP en les que la gent de la comunitat de Cherokee ha mostrat interès. Esperem que la nostra feina no només serveix per informar la comunitat del NLP sobre Cherokee, sinó també per inspirar el futur treball en llengües en perill en general.", 'jv': 'liyane karo Nyimpeng lan nganggep kuwi tindang kuwi nggihasar luwih apik kanggo ngerayakno kanggo meh bantayan dino sing alih dumadhi kanggo kejahatan negori awak dhéwé. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné iso ngbagakake nunggep kuwi NLP iso ngéwangi luwih basa sing ngerasakno. Awak dhéwé suggeruju tanggal telu nggawe praksi sing nyebuté NLP karo pawang nggawe luwih karo komunitas karo perusahaan langa, lan dhéwé pisan karo telu maneh sing nyebuté NLP iso nggawe akeh iso nglanga edukasi langa. Awak dhéwé nggowo Keroke, langa-langa sing wis ngerasahan seneng pisar dumadhi iki dadi, lan kelas kuwi basa. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan nglanggar, akeh nggagunyatan lan banjur kuwi, awak dhéwé (nambah karo perusahaan bakal nggagunyatan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan karo perusahaan Care) dumateng lan nganggep kuwi tindahan sing dibudhakan SMP Awak dhéwé suggeréné sampeyan duwé kanggo nggawe perusahaan langgambar kelas karo perusahaan Universi-ingkang NLP sing sampeyan kanggo wong liyane karo perusahaan NLP iki bakal terus ono wong liyane karo perusahaan nggawe gerakno. Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe komunitas NLP iki dadi kanggo nyelarang nggawe keroké, dadi kedhahé awakdhéwé uga bantuan kanggo nggawe barang langa sing ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno.', 'he': "יותר מ-43% מהשפות שדיברו בעולם בסכנה, ואבדן שפות מתרחש כרגע בקצב מאיץ בגלובליזציה ונאוקולוניאליזם. להציל ולחיות שפות מסוכנות הפכו חשובות מאוד לשמור על מגוון התרבותי על כדור הארץ שלנו. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מתמקדים בדון איך NLP יכול לעזור להחיות שפות מסוכנות. ראשית אנחנו מציעים שלושה עקרונות שיכולים לעזור למקצועי NLP כדי לעודד הבנה הדדית ושיתוף פעולה עם קהילות שפות, ואנחנו מדברים על שלושה דרכים שבהן NLP פוטנציאלית יכול לעזור בחינוך שפות. ואז ניקח את צ'רוקי, שפה מקומית אמריקאית בסכנה רצינית, כמחקר מקרים. לאחר שביקור ההיסטוריה של השפה, תכונות שפתיים, ומשאבים קיימים, אנחנו (בשיתוף פעולה עם חברי קהילה של צ'רוקי) מגיעים לכמה דרכים משמעותיות שמתמודדים של NLP יכולים לשתף פעולה עם שותפים קהילתיים. אנחנו מציעים שתי גישות כדי לעשיר את המשאבים של שפת צ'רוקי עם מעבד מכונת-במעגל, ולדיון על כמה כלים NLP שאנשים מהקהילה צ'רוקי הראו עניין בו. אנו מקווים שהעבודה שלנו משמשת לא רק כדי להודיע לקהילת NLP על צ'רוקי, אלא גם כדי לספק השראה לעבודה עתידית על שפות מסוכנות באופן כללי.", 'ha': "Zaidi 43% daga harshen waɗanda aka faɗa a cikin duniya sun yi haske, kuma hasãra na harshe yanzu za'a iya yi sauri da rabo don globalisiya da neokolonialism. Aka tsare da kure harsunan da aka yi wa haske, yana da muhimu ga tsare mulki-kultur a kan sayarmu. Daga wannan aikin, Munã fokus a kan ka yi musu magana a kan yadda NLP zai iya taimako su fara harsunan da ke cikin hatsi. Tuna shawarar da farko, rubuci uku masu iya taimakon masu amfani da NLP dõmin su ƙarfafa fahimta da nasara da wadan nasa, kuma mu yi jayayya a cikin hanyõyi uku da NLP ke iya ƙarani da masu baran harshe. Sa'an nan kuma za mu karɓi cherokee, a cikin harshen Native-Marekani, kamar wani matsayi. Babu kafarin historin harshen, fassarar linguistic, da maɓallin haye, za mu zo (da shirin ciki tãre da jama'a cherokee) zuwa kaɗan masu hankali da masu amfani da NLP kan su yi aiki da partneri na jamii. Tuna ƙayyade kashi biyu ta wajen rikin mataimaki na harshen cherokee da shirin-cikin-loop, kuma ka yi jayayya da wasu zance na NLP da mutane daga jamii Tsrokee sun nuna marubuci. Munã mature cẽwa aikinmu bã zai iya aikin mu ba dõmin ya gaya wa jamii na NLP game da cherokee, kuma amma suna da aikin wanda ke aikata aikin nan gaba ɗaya a kan harshen da za'a yi hasara a jumla.", 'sk': 'Več kot 43% jezikov, ki se govorijo na svetu, je ogroženih, izguba jezika pa se trenutno pospešuje zaradi globalizacije in neokolonializma. Reševanje in oživljanje ogroženih jezikov je postalo zelo pomembno za ohranjanje kulturne raznolikosti na našem planetu. V tem delu se osredotočamo na razpravo o tem, kako lahko NLP pomaga oživiti ogrožene jezike. Najprej predlagamo tri načela, ki lahko strokovnjakom NLP pomagajo spodbujati medsebojno razumevanje in sodelovanje z jezikovnimi skupnostmi, razpravljamo pa o treh načinih, na katere NLP lahko potencialno pomaga pri izobraževanju jezikov. Za študijo primera vzamemo Cherokee, hudo ogrožen ameriški jezik. Po pregledu zgodovine jezika, jezikovnih značilnosti in obstoječih virov smo (v sodelovanju s člani skupnosti Cherokee) prišli do nekaj smiselnih načinov, na katere lahko delavci NLP sodelujejo s partnerji skupnosti. Predlagamo dva pristopa za obogatitev virov čerokejskega jezika z obdelavo stroja v zanki in razpravljamo o več orodjih NLP, za katera so ljudje iz čerokejske skupnosti pokazali zanimanje. Upamo, da naše delo ne služi le obveščanju skupnosti NLP o čerokem, temveč tudi navdihu za prihodnje delo na področju ogroženih jezikov na splošno.', 'bo': "འཇིག་རྟེན་འདིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གྲངས་ཀྱི་43%ལས་བརྟེན་ནས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་འཚོ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད། ནུས་པ་འདོན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག NLP ནང་དུ་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་གཏོང་གི་ཐད་ནས་གནད་དོན ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ནས་NLP དགའ་ཅན་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཚོར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོར་རྒྱ་ནག་ལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་མི་རྣམས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཞིག་ལ་བལྟ་བུ་བཏང་བ་ཡིན། སྐད་ཡིག We suggest two approaches to enrich the Cherokee language's resources with machine-in-the-loop processing, and discuss several NLP tools that people from the Cherokee community have shown interest in. ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ནི་Cherokee་གི་སྐོར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་གཅིག་པུ་མིན་པར་NLP ཚོགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལ་བརྡ་གཏོང་རྒྱུ་དང་། དེ་ཡང་ན་ང་ཚོའི་མ་འོངས་བའི་"}
{'en': 'Accurate Online Posterior Alignments for Principled Lexically-Constrained Decoding', 'pt': 'Ator-crítico multiagente diferenciável para resumo do relatório de radiologia de várias etapas', 'ar': 'ناقد ممثل متعدد العوامل قابل للتفاضل لتلخيص تقرير الأشعة متعدد الخطوات', 'es': 'Actor-crítico diferenciable de múltiples agentes para el resumen de informes de radiología de varios pasos', 'fr': 'Acteur-critique multi-agents différenciable pour la synthèse de rapports de radiologie en plusieurs étapes', 'ja': '多段階放射線検査のための差別化可能なマルチエージェントアクター-批評家レポートの要約', 'hi': 'Multi-Step Radiology Report Summarization के लिए Differentiable Multi-Agent Actor-Critic', 'zh': '多步骤放射学报摘要者可微分多署演员-评家', 'ru': 'Дифференцируемый мультиагентный актёр-критик для суммирования многоэтапного рентгенологического отчета', 'ga': 'Aisteoir-Ghníomhaire Ilghníomhaire Difreáilte maidir le hAchoimriú Tuairisce Raideolaíochta Ilchéime', 'el': 'Διαφορετικός παράγοντας-κριτικός για την έκθεση ακτινολογίας πολλαπλών βημάτων', 'hu': 'Differenciálható több ügynökből álló aktor-kritikus a többlépéses radiológiai jelentés összefoglalásához', 'ka': 'განსხვავებული მრავალ- ადვნენტის აქტორი- კრიტიკური მრავალე პადიოლოგიის შეცდომა', 'kk': 'Көп- қадам радиология хабарламасының көп- агенттік актор- критикасы', 'lt': 'Daugiapakopės radiologinės ataskaitos apibendrinimas', 'it': 'Critico attore multi-agente differenziabile per la sintesi del rapporto di radiologia multi-passo', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'Multi- Step Radiology Report Summary', 'ms': 'Differentiable Multi-Agent Actor-Critic for Multi-Step Radiology Report Summarization', 'mn': 'Олон-Step Radiology Report Summary', 'mt': 'Sommarju tar-Rapport dwar ir-Radjoloġija f’Passi Multi', 'no': 'Forskjellig fleire-agent-aktorekritisk for samandring av fleirsteg radiologisk rapport', 'ro': 'Critic actor-agent diferențiabil pentru rezumarea raportului de radiologie în mai multe etape', 'pl': 'Zróżnicowany wielokrotny aktor krytyczny dla wielostopniowego raportu radiologicznego', 'sr': 'Različni multi-agentni aktor-kritičan za sažetak izveštaja o radiologiji više koraka', 'so': 'Report Summariisation', 'sv': 'Differentierbar multi-agent aktor-kritisk för flerstegsrapport sammanfattning', 'si': 'Multi-Step Radio report', 'ta': 'பல- படி ஆராய்ச்சி அறிக்கை சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'Multi-Step Radiology Report Summarization', 'uz': 'Differentiable Multi-Agent Actor-Critic for Multi-Step Radiology Report Summarization', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Диференцируем мултиагентен актьор-критик за многостепенен рентгенов доклад Обобщение', 'nl': 'Differentieerbare Multi-Agent Actor-Criticus voor Multi-Step Radiologie Rapport Samenvatting', 'hr': 'Različiti višestruki glumac-kritičan za izvještaj o radiologiji višestrukih koraka', 'da': 'Differentierbar Multi-Agent Actor-Critic for Multi-Step Radiology Report Summarisation', 'de': 'Differenzierbarer Multi-Agent Actor-Critic für Multi-Step Radiology Report Zusammenfassung', 'fa': 'بازیگر چندین مامور متفاوتی برای جمع کردن گزارش رادیولوژی چندین قدم', 'ko': '다단계 방사능 보고서 요약에 사용되는 마이크로 다중지능체 참여자 비평가', 'tr': 'Çoklu-aýal Radyologiýa Raporty üçin üýtgeşmeler', 'sw': 'Katika taarifa za rediolojia za Tamko-Mkosuko wa Mwanaharakati wa Mitandao', 'af': 'Verskillende Multi-Agent Actor-Kritik vir Multi-Step Radiologie Raportopsommariseering', 'sq': 'Kritik i ndryshueshëm i aktorit multiagjent për përmbledhjen e raportit të radiologjisë me shumë hapa', 'am': 'Differentiable Multi-Agent Actor-Critic for Multi-Step Radiology Report Summarization', 'hy': 'Բազմաքայլերի ռադիոլոգիայի զեկույցը', 'bn': 'Multi-Step Radiology রিপোর্ট সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত', 'az': 'Çoxlu-adım radioloji Raporu Toplaşdırma', 'bs': 'Različno višestruko-agenticno glumce-kritično za sažetak izvješća o radiologiji više koraka', 'id': 'Penapis Laporan Radiologi Multi-Agen Aktor-Kritik Differentiable', 'ca': "Actor-crític multiagente diferenciable per a resumir l'informe de radiologia multipas", 'cs': 'Rozlišitelný multi-agent aktor kritický pro vícestupňové radiologické zprávy Shrnutí', 'fi': 'Eristettävä moniagentti-kriitikko monivaiheiselle radiologiaraportille Yhteenveto', 'et': 'Mitmeastmelise radioloogiaaruande kokkuvõte eristatav mitmeastmeline tegur-kriitik', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Diferenciable Multi-Agent Actor-Critic for Multi-Step Radiology Report Povzetek', 'he': 'קריטיקה במשחק רב סוכנים אפשרית למסכם דיווח רדיולוגי רב צעדים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Differentiable Multi-Agent Actor-Critic for Multi-Step Radiology Report Summarization'}
{'en': 'Online alignment in machine translation refers to the task of aligning a target word to a source word when the target sequence has only been partially decoded. Good online alignments facilitate important applications such as lexically constrained translation where user-defined dictionaries are used to inject lexical constraints into the translation model. We propose a novel posterior alignment technique that is truly online in its execution and superior in terms of alignment error rates compared to existing methods. Our proposed inference technique jointly considers alignment and token probabilities in a principled manner and can be seamlessly integrated within existing constrained beam-search decoding algorithms. On five language pairs, including two distant language pairs, we achieve consistent drop in alignment error rates. When deployed on seven lexically constrained translation tasks, we achieve significant improvements in BLEU specifically around the constrained positions.', 'ar': 'قسم IMPRESSIONS من تقرير الأشعة حول دراسة التصوير هو ملخص لاستدلالات واستنتاجات أخصائي الأشعة ، كما أنه يساعد الطبيب المُحيل في تأكيد أو استبعاد بعض التشخيصات. هناك حاجة إلى سلسلة من المهام لإنشاء ملخص تجريدي تلقائيًا لتقرير الأشعة الغني بالمعلومات النموذجي. تتضمن هذه المهام الحصول على المحتوى البارز من التقرير وإنشاء قسم IMPRESSIONS موجز وسهل الاستهلاك. ركزت الأبحاث السابقة حول تلخيص تقرير الأشعة على النماذج ذات الخطوة الواحدة من طرف إلى طرف - والتي تستوعب مهمة الحصول على المحتوى البارز. لاستكشاف هيكل التسلسل وإمكانية شرح تلخيص تقرير الأشعة بشكل كامل ، نقدم ابتكارين. أولاً ، نصمم نهجًا من خطوتين: التلخيص الاستخراجي متبوعًا بالتلخيص التجريدي. ثانيًا ، نقوم أيضًا بتقسيم الجزء الاستخراجي إلى مهمتين مستقلتين: استخراج (1) جمل بارزة و (2) كلمات رئيسية. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعة بيانات تقرير الأشعة المتاحة للجمهور أن نهجنا الجديد يؤدي إلى ملخص أكثر دقة مقارنة بخطوة واحدة وخطوط أساس عملية استخلاصية من خطوتين مع تحسن عام في درجة F1 بنسبة 3-4٪.', 'es': 'La sección IMPRESIONES de un informe radiológico sobre un estudio de imágenes es un resumen del razonamiento y las conclusiones del radiólogo, y también ayuda al médico remitente a confirmar o excluir ciertos diagnósticos. Se requiere una cascada de tareas para generar automáticamente un resumen abstractivo del informe radiológico típico rico en información. Estas tareas incluyen la adquisición de contenido destacado del informe y la generación de una sección IMPRESSIONS concisa y fácilmente consumible. La investigación previa sobre el resumen de informes de radiología se ha centrado en modelos de un solo paso a extremo, que subsumen la tarea de adquisición de contenido destacado. Para explorar completamente la estructura en cascada y la explicabilidad del resumen de los informes radiológicos, presentamos dos innovaciones. Primero, diseñamos un enfoque de dos pasos: resumen extractivo seguido de resumen abstractivo. En segundo lugar, también dividimos la parte extractiva en dos tareas independientes: extracción de (1) frases destacadas y (2) palabras clave. Los experimentos en un conjunto de datos de informes radiológicos disponibles públicamente muestran que nuestro enfoque novedoso conduce a un resumen más preciso en comparación con las líneas de base de un solo paso y dos pasos con un solo proceso extractivo con una mejora general en la puntuación F1 del 3 al 4%.', 'fr': "La section IMPRESSIONS d'un rapport de radiologie sur une étude d'imagerie est un résumé du raisonnement et des conclusions du radiologue, et elle aide également le médecin traitant à confirmer ou à exclure certains diagnostics. Une cascade de tâches est requise pour générer automatiquement un résumé abstrait du rapport de radiologie riche en informations typique. Ces tâches comprennent l'acquisition du contenu important à partir du rapport et la génération d'une section IMPRESSIONS concise et facile à utiliser. Les recherches antérieures sur la synthèse des rapports de radiologie se sont concentrées sur des modèles de bout en bout en une seule étape, qui engloberaient la tâche d'acquisition de contenu important. Pour explorer pleinement la structure en cascade et l'explicabilité de la synthèse des rapports de radiologie, nous introduisons deux innovations. Tout d'abord, nous concevons une approche en deux étapes\xa0: la synthèse extractive suivie d'une synthèse abstraite. Ensuite, nous divisons également la partie extractive en deux tâches indépendantes\xa0: l'extraction des phrases saillantes (1) et (2) des mots-clés. Des expériences sur un ensemble de données de rapports de radiologie accessibles au public montrent que notre approche novatrice conduit à un résumé plus précis par rapport aux bases de référence en une étape et à deux étapes avec un seul processus d'extraction avec une amélioration globale du score F1 de 3 à 4\xa0%.", 'pt': 'A seção IMPRESSÕES de um laudo radiológico sobre um estudo de imagem é um resumo do raciocínio e das conclusões do radiologista e também auxilia o médico solicitante na confirmação ou exclusão de certos diagnósticos. Uma cascata de tarefas é necessária para gerar automaticamente um resumo abstrato do relatório típico de radiologia rico em informações. Essas tarefas incluem a aquisição de conteúdo saliente do relatório e a geração de uma seção de IMPRESSÕES concisa e facilmente consumível. Pesquisas anteriores sobre resumo de relatórios de radiologia se concentraram em modelos de ponta a ponta de etapa única - que incluem a tarefa de aquisição de conteúdo saliente. Para explorar completamente a estrutura em cascata e a explicabilidade da sumarização de relatórios de radiologia, apresentamos duas inovações. Primeiro, projetamos uma abordagem em duas etapas: sumarização extrativa seguida de sumarização abstrativa. Em segundo lugar, também dividimos a parte extrativa em duas tarefas independentes: extração de (1) sentenças salientes e (2) palavras-chave. Experimentos em um conjunto de dados de relatórios de radiologia disponíveis publicamente mostram que nossa nova abordagem leva a um resumo mais preciso em comparação com as linhas de base de uma única etapa e de duas etapas com um processo de extração único, com uma melhoria geral na pontuação F1 de 3-4%.', 'ja': '画像診断に関する放射線検査レポートの「印象」セクションは、放射線科医の推論と結論の要約であり、特定の診断を確認または除外するのに役立ちます。 典型的な情報豊富な放射線学レポートの抽象的な要約を自動的に生成するためには、一連のタスクが必要です。 これらのタスクには、レポートから顕著なコンテンツを取得し、簡潔で消費しやすいインプレッションセクションを生成することが含まれます。 放射線学レポートの要約に関する以前の研究は、シングルステップエンドツーエンドモデルに焦点を当てており、これには顕著なコンテンツの取得のタスクが含まれています。 放射線学的報告の要約のカスケード構造と説明可能性を完全に探るために、2つのイノベーションを紹介します。 まず、抽象的要約と抽象的要約の2段階のアプローチを設計します。 第二に、抽出部分をさらに2つの独立したタスクに分類します。つまり、顕著な（ 1 ）文と（ 2 ）キーワードの抽出です。 一般に入手可能な放射線学的レポートデータセットの実験では、当社の新規アプローチは、Ｆ１スコアの全体的な改善が３ ～ ４ ％である単一ステップおよび単一抽出プロセスによる２ステップのベースラインと比較して、より正確な要約につながることが示されている。', 'zh': '放射学告影像学者IMPRESSIONS放射科医推理结论之摘要,有助于转诊者。 须连串自生典型放射学报抽象摘要。 凡此诸事,取要于告,而成简要易用之 IMPRESSIONS 。 昔于放射学告摘要之论集于单步端 - 其有章取之务。 穷探放射学报摘要级联结构可解释性,引入两端。 先设一两步法:提取性摘要,然后抽象摘要。 次分两独立:取(1)句、(2)关键字。 明可用者放射学告数集之实验,比于单步、双步单之基线,新法精摘要,F1评分总崇3-4%。', 'hi': 'एक इमेजिंग अध्ययन के बारे में रेडियोलॉजी रिपोर्ट का इंप्रेशन अनुभाग रेडियोलॉजिस्ट के तर्क और निष्कर्षों का सारांश है, और यह कुछ निदानों की पुष्टि करने या बाहर करने में संदर्भित चिकित्सक को भी सहायता करता है। कार्यों का एक कैस्केड स्वचालित रूप से विशिष्ट जानकारी-समृद्ध रेडियोलॉजी रिपोर्ट का एक अमूर्त सारांश उत्पन्न करने के लिए आवश्यक है। इन कार्यों में रिपोर्ट से मुख्य सामग्री का अधिग्रहण और एक संक्षिप्त, आसानी से उपभोग योग्य इंप्रेशन अनुभाग का उत्पादन शामिल है। रेडियोलॉजी रिपोर्ट सारांशीकरण पर पूर्व शोध ने एकल-चरण यी अंत-से-अंत मॉडल पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है - जो मुख्य सामग्री अधिग्रहण के कार्य को समाहित करता है। पूरी तरह से कैस्केड संरचना और रेडियोलॉजी रिपोर्ट सारांश की व्याख्या का पता लगाने के लिए, हम दो नवाचारों को पेश करते हैं। सबसे पहले, हम एक दो-चरणीय दृष्टिकोण डिजाइन करते हैं: अमूर्त सारांशीकरण के बाद निष्कर्षण सारांशीकरण। दूसरा, हम इसके अलावा दो स्वतंत्र कार्यों में निष्कर्षण भाग को तोड़ते हैं: मुख्य (1) वाक्यों और (2) कीवर्ड का निष्कर्षण। एक सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध रेडियोलॉजी रिपोर्ट डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारे उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण से एकल-चरण की तुलना में अधिक सटीक सारांश होता है और 3-4% के एफ 1 स्कोर में समग्र सुधार के साथ दो-चरण-एकल-निष्कर्षण-प्रक्रिया बेसलाइन के लिए।', 'ru': 'Раздел «ВПЕЧАТЛЕНИЯ» рентгенологического отчета об исследовании визуализации представляет собой резюме рассуждений и выводов рентгенолога, а также помогает направившему врачу подтвердить или исключить определенные диагнозы. Для автоматической генерации абстрактного резюме типичного рентгенологического отчета, содержащего обширную информацию, требуется каскад задач. Эти задачи включают в себя получение основного содержания из отчета и создание краткого, легко расходуемого раздела ПОКАЗОВ. Предыдущие исследования по обобщению рентгенологических отчетов были сосредоточены на одноэтапных сквозных моделях, которые включают задачу получения существенного содержания. Чтобы полностью исследовать каскадную структуру и объяснимость резюме радиологического отчета, мы вводим две инновации. Во-первых, мы разрабатываем двухэтапный подход: экстрактивное обобщение с последующим абстрактным обобщением. Во-вторых, мы дополнительно разбиваем добывающую часть на две самостоятельные задачи: извлечение явно выраженных (1) предложений и (2) ключевых слов. Эксперименты с общедоступным набором данных рентгенологического отчета показывают, что наш новый подход приводит к более точному резюме по сравнению с одноэтапным и двухэтапным с одним экстрактивным процессом с общим улучшением балла по шкале F1 на 3-4%.', 'ga': 'Achoimre ar réasúnaíocht agus ar chonclúidí an raideolaí atá sa chuid IMPRESSIONS de thuarascáil raideolaíochta faoi staidéar íomháithe, agus cuidíonn sé freisin leis an dochtúir atreoraithe chun diagnóisí áirithe a dhearbhú nó a eisiamh. Teastaíonn raon tascanna chun achoimre teibí a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch den ghnáththuarascáil raideolaíochta ar mhórán faisnéise. I measc na dtascanna seo tá fáil ar ábhar suntasach ón tuarascáil agus giniúint rannán achomair, IMPRESSIONS go héasca. Dhírigh réamhthaighde ar achoimriú tuarascálacha raideolaíochta ar mhúnlaí aonchéime ó cheann ceann go ceann -- a chomhchuimsíonn an tasc maidir le hábhar suntasach a fháil. Chun iniúchadh iomlán a dhéanamh ar struchtúr easghluaiseachta agus ar inmhínithe achoimre tuairisce raideolaíochta, tugaimid isteach dhá nuálaíocht. Ar dtús, déanaimid cur chuige dhá chéim a dhearadh: achoimriú eastóscach agus achoimre teibí ina dhiaidh sin. Ar an dara dul síos, déanaimid an chuid eastóscach a mhiondealú ina dhá thasc neamhspleácha freisin: asbhaint abairtí suntasacha (1) agus (2) eochairfhocail. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacar sonraí tuairisce raideolaíochta atá ar fáil go poiblí go n-eascraíonn ár gcur chuige nua achoimre níos cruinne i gcomparáid le bonnlínte aonchéime agus dhá chéim le próiseas eastóscach aonair agus feabhas foriomlán ar an scór F1 de 3-4%.', 'el': 'Το τμήμα ΕΙΣΑΓΩΓΗΣ μιας ακτινολογικής έκθεσης σχετικά με μια απεικονιστική μελέτη είναι μια περίληψη των συλλογισμών και των συμπερασμάτων του ακτινολόγου και βοηθά επίσης τον αιτούντα ιατρό να επιβεβαιώσει ή να αποκλείσει ορισμένες διαγνώσεις. Απαιτείται μια σειρά εργασιών για να δημιουργηθεί αυτόματα μια αφηρημένη περίληψη της τυπικής ακτινολογικής έκθεσης πλούσιας σε πληροφορίες. Τα καθήκοντα αυτά περιλαμβάνουν την απόκτηση σημαντικού περιεχομένου από την έκθεση και τη δημιουργία μιας συνοπτικής, εύκολα αναλώσιμης ενότητας ΕΙΣΑΓΩΓΗΣ. Προηγουμένες έρευνες σχετικά με τη σύνοψη των ακτινολογικών εκθέσεων έχουν επικεντρωθεί σε μοντέλα ενός σταδίου, τα οποία υποθέτουν το έργο της απόκτησης σημαντικού περιεχομένου. Για να διερευνήσουμε πλήρως τη δομή των καταρρακτών και την επεξήγηση της σύνοψης των ακτινολογικών εκθέσεων, εισάγουμε δύο καινοτομίες. Πρώτον, σχεδιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση δύο βημάτων: την αποσπαστική σύνοψη ακολουθούμενη από την αφηρημένη σύνοψη. Δεύτερον, αναλύουμε επιπλέον το αποσπαστικό μέρος σε δύο ανεξάρτητες εργασίες: εξαγωγή σημαντικών (1) προτάσεων και (2) λέξεων-κλειδιών. Τα πειράματα σε ένα δημοσίως διαθέσιμο σύνολο δεδομένων ακτινολογικής έκθεσης δείχνουν ότι η νέα προσέγγιση μας οδηγεί σε μια πιο ακριβή περίληψη σε σύγκριση με τις γραμμές βάσης ενός σταδίου και δύο βημάτων με μια ενιαία εκχύλιση-διεργασίας με μια συνολική βελτίωση του βαθμού F1 3-4%.', 'ka': 'IMPRESSIONS პაეთოლოგიის რეპორტის შესახებ გამოსახულების შესახებ არის პაეთოლოგისტის პარამენტის და გადასრულების რეზიუმენტი, და ასევე იგივე დახმარებს რეპორტირებული ექსექტის განახულებაში ან განახულება დავალებების კასკადის მოჭირდება, რომ ავტომატურად აბსტრაქტიური რეზიუმენტი ინფორმაციის ბეჭდვი პაეთოლოგიის რეპორტის აბსტრაქტიური რეზიუმენტის შექ ამ დავალებების შესახებ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ რეპორტიდან და წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ, ადვილად პირველი პარადიოლოგიის შესახებ სიმბოლოების შესახებ მოდელების შესახებ, რომლებიც ერთადერთი კონფიგურაციის მოდელების შესახებ დააყენება. კასკადის სტრუქტურაციას და პაეთოლოგიის შესახებ გამოსახულებელობას, ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ორი ინონოციაციას. პირველად, ჩვენ ორ-კვადრატიური გადავყენებთ: ექსტრაქტიური გადასრულება, შემდეგ აბსტრაქტიური გადასრულება. მეორე, ჩვენ დამატებით ექსტრაქტიური ნაწილის ორი განსაზღვრებული დავალებში გავშვებთ: სილიენტის (1) სიტყვები და (2) სიტყვების ექსტრაქცია. პროცემენტები განსაზღვრებული პაეთოლოგიის მონაცემების შესახებ ჩვენი პროცემენტის შესახებ უფრო დარწმუნდება, რომელიც უფრო დარწმუნდება ერთ-კვადრატის და ორ-კვადრატიული ერთ-კვადრატიული პროცესის ბაზი', 'hu': 'A radiológiai jelentés IMPRESSIONS része egy képalkotó vizsgálatra vonatkozóan a radiológus érvelésének és következtetéseinek összefoglalása, valamint segíti a javasolt orvost bizonyos diagnózisok megerősítésében vagy kizárásában. A tipikus információban gazdag radiológiai jelentés absztraktív összefoglalójának automatikus létrehozásához szükséges feladatok kaszkádja. Ezek a feladatok közé tartozik a jelentés kiemelkedő tartalmának beszerzése és egy tömör, könnyen fogyasztható IMPRESSIONS rész létrehozása. A radiológiai jelentések összefoglalásával kapcsolatos korábbi kutatások az egylépéses end-to-end modellekre összpontosítottak -- amelyek alávetik a kiemelkedő tartalomszerzés feladatát. A radiológiai jelentések összefoglalásának kaszkádszerkezetének és magyarázhatóságának teljes körű feltárása érdekében két innovációt mutatunk be. Először egy kétlépcsős megközelítést tervezünk: extraktív összefoglalás, majd absztraktív összefoglalás. Másodszor, az extraktív részt továbbá két független feladatra bontjuk: kiemelkedő (1) mondatok és (2) kulcsszavak kivonása. Egy nyilvánosan hozzáférhető radiológiai jelentések adatkészletén végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy új megközelítésünk pontosabb összefoglalást eredményez az egylépéses és kétlépéses extraktív folyamatú alapkészletekhez képest, az F1 pontszám általános javulása 3-4%.', 'it': "La sezione IMPRESSIONI di un rapporto radiologico su uno studio di imaging è un riassunto del ragionamento e delle conclusioni del radiologo e aiuta anche il medico di riferimento a confermare o escludere determinate diagnosi. Una cascata di compiti è necessaria per generare automaticamente un riassunto astratto del tipico rapporto radiologico ricco di informazioni. Questi compiti includono l'acquisizione di contenuti salienti dal report e la generazione di una sezione IMPRESSIONI concisa e facilmente consumabile. La ricerca preliminare sulla sintesi dei rapporti radiologici si è concentrata su modelli end-to-end in fase singola -- che sottosume il compito di acquisizione di contenuti salienti. Per esplorare appieno la struttura a cascata e l'spiegabilità della sintesi dei rapporti radiologici, introduciamo due innovazioni. In primo luogo, progettiamo un approccio in due fasi: sintesi estrattiva seguita da sintesi astratta. In secondo luogo, ripartiamo ulteriormente la parte estrattiva in due compiti indipendenti: estrazione di frasi salienti (1) e (2) parole chiave. Esperimenti su un set di dati di radiologia disponibile pubblicamente mostrano che il nostro nuovo approccio porta a una sintesi più precisa rispetto alle linee di base a singolo e a due fasi con singolo processo estrattivo con un miglioramento complessivo del punteggio F1 del 3-4%.", 'lt': 'Radiologinio tyrimo įspūdžio ataskaitos skyrius „ĮSPĖJIMAI“ yra radiologinio gydytojo motyvų ir išvadų santrauka, taip pat padeda kreipiamajam gydytojui patvirtinti ar atmesti tam tikrą diagnozę. A cascade of tasks are required to automatically generate an abstractive summary of the typical information-rich radiology report.  Šios užduotys apima svarbiausio turinio įsigijimą iš ataskaitos ir trumpo, lengvai suvartojamo ĮSPĖJIMO skyriaus sukūrimą. Ankstesniuose radiologijos ataskaitų santraukos tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama vieno etapo nuo vieno iki kito modeliams, kurie apima užduotį įsigyti druskos turinį. Siekiant išsamiai išnagrinėti kaskadų struktūrą ir radiologijos ataskaitos santraukos paaiškinimą, mes įvedame dvi naujoves. Pirma, mes parengiame dviejų etapų metodą: ekstraktyvią santrauką ir abstraktišką santrauką. Antra, mes papildomai suskirstysime išgaunamąją dalį į dvi nepriklausomas užduotis: išgaunami svarbiausi (1) sakiniai ir (2) pagrindiniai žodžiai. Visuomenei prieinamų radiologinių ataskaitų duomenų rinkinio eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų naujas metodas suteikia tikslesnę santrauką, palyginti su vieno etapo ir dviejų etapų su vienu gavybos proceso bazinėmis linijomis, o bendras F1 rezultato pagerėjimas – 3–4 %.', 'kk': 'Кескіндік зерттеу туралы радиологиялық хабарламасының IMPRESSIONS бөлігі радиологизмнің сезімі мен түсініктерінің тұжырымдамасы, сондай-ақ ол кейбір диагностикаларды құптау немесе өзгерту үшін сілтемелер дә Тапсырмаларды автоматты түрде қалыпты мәлімет бағасы радиология хабарламасының абстрактивті тұжырымдамасын құру үшін керек. Бұл тапсырмалар хабарламадан және құрылғандағы жұмыс, оңай пайдалану үшін IMPRESSIONS бөлімінен тұратын мазмұнын алу. Радиология хабарламасының жазуының алдындағы зерттеулері бір қадам соңғы- соңғы үлгілеріне назар ауыстырылды. Бұл салай мазмұнын алу тапсырмасына көмектеседі. Каскад құрылымын және радиология туралы хабарламалардың күнтізбесін толық зерттеу үшін біз екі инновацияларды таңдаймыз. Біріншіден, біз екі қадам тәсілді құрамыз: абстрактивті тәсілдерді таңдау. Екіншіден, екі тәуелсіз тапсырмаға шығарылған бөлігін қосымша бөліскен бөліскен бөлігіміз: салиентті (1) сөздерді және (2) сөздерді шығару. Қолданатын радиология хабарламалардың тәжірибелері, біздің романдық тәжірибеміздің тәжірибесіміз бір қадам мен бір қадам экстрактивті процестің негізгі сызықтарымен, F1 деңгейіндегі 3- 4% деңгейіндегі жақсартылығымен бір', 'mk': 'Одделот ИМПРЕСИОНИ од извештајот за радиологија за студијата на слика е резултат на размислувањата и заклучоците на радиологот, и исто така му помага на докторот во потврдувањето или исклучувањето на одредени дијагнози. Каскада на задачи се потребни за автоматски да се генерира апстрактивен резултат на типичниот извештај за радиологија богат со информации. Овие задачи вклучуваат купување на основна содржина од извештајот и генерација на кратка, лесно конзумирана секција ИМПРЕСИЈА. Претходното истражување за резултатот на извештајот за радиологија се фокусираше на моделите од еден чекор до крај -- кои ја потпишуваат задачата за набавување на основна содржина. За целосно да ја истражуваме каскадната структура и објаснливоста на резултатот на радиолошкиот извештај, воведуваме две иновации. First, we design a two-step approach: extractive summarization followed by abstractive summarization.  Second, we additionally break down the extractive part into two independent tasks: extraction of salient (1) sentences and (2) keywords.  Експериментите на јавно достапниот компјутер на податоци за радиологијата покажуваат дека нашиот нов пристап води до попрецизен резултат во споредба со еден чекор и на базите на два чекори со еден екстрактивен процес со целокупно подобрување на оценката F1 од 3 до 4 отсто.', 'ms': 'Seksyen IMPRESI laporan radiologi mengenai kajian imej adalah ringkasan alasan dan kesimpulan radiologi, dan ia juga membantu doktor rujuk dalam mengesahkan atau mengecualikan diagnosis tertentu. Kaskad tugas diperlukan untuk secara automatik menghasilkan ringkasan abstraktif laporan radiologi kaya maklumat biasa. Tugas-tugas ini termasuk memperoleh kandungan salient dari laporan dan generasi seksyen IMPRESI yang singkat dan mudah dimakan. Prior research on radiology report summarization has focused on single-step end-to-end models -- which subsume the task of salient content acquisition.  Untuk mengeksplorasi secara penuh struktur kaskad dan penjelasan ringkasan laporan radiologi, kami memperkenalkan dua inovasi. Pertama, kita merancang pendekatan dua langkah: penghasilan ekstraktif diikuti oleh penghasilan abstraktif. Second, we additionally break down the extractive part into two independent tasks: extraction of salient (1) sentences and (2) keywords.  Eksperimen pada set data laporan radiologi yang tersedia secara umum menunjukkan pendekatan novel kita membawa kepada ringkasan yang lebih tepat dibandingkan dengan langkah tunggal dan ke garis dasar dua langkah dengan proses ekstraktif tunggal dengan peningkatan umum pada skor F1 3-4%.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ചിത്ര പഠനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് ഒരു റേഡിയോളജി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ IMPRESSIONS ഭാഗമാണ് റേഡിയോളജിന്റെ കാരണങ്ങളും അവസാനത്തെയും കുറിച്ചുള്ളത്. അതും ചില ഡ സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d- rich റേഡിയോളജി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ സ്വയമായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്വയം വെറുതെയില്ലാത്ത ഒരു  ഈ ജോലികള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും തലമുറപ്പില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് എളുപ്പമുള്ള IMPRESSIONS സെക്ഷനില്\u200d നിന്ന റേഡിയോളജി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ കുറിച്ചുള്ള പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ മുമ്പുള്ള പരിശോധന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത റേഡിയോളജി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് സംസാരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി കാസ്കേഡ് ഘടനയെ പരിശോധിക്കാനും വിശദീകരിക്കാ ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് പടിയിലേക്ക് ഒരു പ്രാധാന്യം ഡിസൈനര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു: പുറപ്പെട്ട സംഖ്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പിന്നീട രണ്ടാമതായി, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ ജോലികളിലേക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന ഭാഗം കൂടുതല്\u200d തകര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. സാലിയന്\u200dറെ വാക്കുകളിലേക ഒരു പൊതുവായി ലഭ്യമായ റേഡിയോളജി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് സജ്ജീകരണത്തിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നോവല്\u200d നടപടിയിലേക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശിഷ്ടമായ സുരുക്ഷിയിലേക്ക് കാണിക്കുന', 'mt': "It-taqsima IMPRESSJONIJIET ta’ rapport radjoloġiku dwar studju ta’ immaġni hija sommarju tar-raġunament u l-konklużjonijiet tar-radjologu, u tgħin ukoll lit-tabib referenti biex jikkonferma jew jeskludi ċerti dijanjożijiet. Kaxxa ta’ kompiti hija meħtieġa biex awtomatikament tiġġenera sommarju astrattiv tar-rapport tipiku tar-radjoloġija rikka fl-informazzjoni. Dawn il-kompiti jinkludu l-akkwist ta’ kontenut salienti mir-rapport u l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ taqsima tal-IMPRESSJONIJIET konċiża u faċilment konsumabbli. Ir-riċerka preċedenti dwar is-sommarju tar-rapport dwar ir-radjoloġija ffukat fuq mudelli ta' stadju wieħed minn tarf sa tarf -- li jissottomettu l-kompitu ta' akkwist ta' kontenut salienti. Biex nesploraw bis-sħiħ l-istruttura tal-kaskata u l-ispjegabbiltà tas-sommarju tar-rapport dwar ir-radjoloġija, aħna nintroduċu żewġ innovazzjonijiet. L-ewwel nett, niddisinjaw approċċ f’żewġ stadji: sommarju estrattiv segwit minn sommarju astrattiv. It-tieni nett, inqasmu wkoll il-parti estrattiva f’żewġ kompiti indipendenti: l-estrazzjoni ta’ sentenzi salienti (1) u (2) kliem ewlieni. L-esperimenti fuq sett ta’ dejta dwar ir-rapport dwar ir-radjoloġija disponibbli għall-pubbliku juru li l-approċċ il-ġdid tagħna jwassal għal sommarju aktar preċiż meta mqabbel ma’ linji bażi ta’ proċess wieħed u ta’ żewġ stadji ma’ proċess wieħed estrattiv b’titjib globali fil-punteġġ F1 ta’ 3-4 %.", 'mn': 'Дүрслэлийн судалгааны радиологийн мэдээллийн хэсэг нь радиологийн шалтгаан болон дарааллын нийтлэл юм. Энэ нь мөн дарааллын эмч нарт зарим шинжлэх ухааны шалтгааныг тодорхойлж эсвэл хадгалахын тулд тусалдаг. Ажлын каскад нь мэдээллийн баян радиологийн мэдээллийг автоматаар автоматаар бий болгох хэрэгтэй. Эдгээр үйл ажиллагаанууд нь тайлбарлаас, түгээмэл, амархан хэрэглэгддэг ИМПРЕСИОН хэсэг болон түгээмэл бүтээгдэхүүнийг авдаг. Радиологийн мэдээллийн хэвлэлийн өмнөх судалгаагаар нэг алхмын төгсгөл-төгсгөл загварууд дээр анхаарлаа хандуулсан. Энэ нь сайхан бүтээгдэхүүний худалдааны даалгаврыг багасгадаг. Каскад бүтцийг бүрэн судалж, радиологийн хэвлэлийн тодорхойлж чаддаг талаар бид хоёр шинэчлэл бий болгодог. Эхлээд, бид хоёр алхам арга загвар зохион байгуулсан: нэмэлт тодруулалт, abstractive summarization. Хоёрт, бид нэмэлт хэсгийг хоёр тогтнолтой ажил болгож хувааж байна: шингэний (1) өгүүлбэр болон (2) түлхүүр үг. Олон нийтийн радиологийн өгөгдлийн хэвлэлийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний шинэ арга зам нь нэг алхам, нэг алхам, нэг давхар үйлдвэрлэлийн суурь шулуунтай харьцуулахад илүү тодорхой тодорхойлолтой харуулж байна. F1-ийн 3-4 хувьд нийтлэг сайжруулалт гар', 'pl': 'Sekcja IMPRESJE raportu radiologicznego dotyczącego badania obrazowego jest streszczeniem rozumowania i wniosków radiologa, a także pomaga lekarzowi skierowającemu w potwierdzeniu lub wykluczeniu niektórych diagnoz. Kaskada zadań jest wymagana do automatycznego wygenerowania abstrakcyjnego podsumowania typowego raportu radiologicznego bogatego w informacje. Zadania te obejmują pozyskiwanie istotnych treści z raportu oraz generowanie zwięzłej, łatwo wykorzystywanej sekcji IMPRESSIONS. Wcześniejsze badania nad podsumowaniem raportów radiologicznych koncentrowały się na jednostopniowych modelach end-to-end, które podsumowują zadanie pozyskiwania istotnych treści. Aby w pełni zbadać strukturę kaskadową i wytłumaczalność podsumowania raportów radiologicznych, wprowadzamy dwie innowacje. Najpierw projektujemy podejście dwuetapowe: ekstrakcyjne podsumowanie, a następnie abstrakcyjne podsumowanie. Po drugie, dodatkowo podzielimy część ekstrakcyjną na dwa niezależne zadania: ekstrakcję wyraźnych (1) zdań i (2) słów kluczowych. Eksperymenty na publicznie dostępnym zbiorze danych raportów radiologicznych pokazują, że nasze nowatorskie podejście prowadzi do bardziej precyzyjnego podsumowania w porównaniu do linii bazowych jednostopniowych i dwustopniowych z pojedynczym procesem ekstrakcyjnym z ogólną poprawą wyniku F1 o 3-4%.', 'ro': 'Secțiunea IMPRESIUNI dintr-un raport radiologic despre un studiu de imagistică este un rezumat al raționamentului și concluziilor radiologului și, de asemenea, ajută medicul de referință în confirmarea sau excluderea anumitor diagnostice. Este necesară o cascadă de sarcini pentru a genera automat un rezumat abstractiv al raportului radiologic tipic bogat în informații. Aceste sarcini includ achiziționarea de conținut important din raport și generarea unei secțiuni concise, ușor de consumat IMPRESIUNI. Cercetările anterioare privind rezumarea rapoartelor radiologice s-au concentrat pe modele end-to-end într-un singur pas -- care subumează sarcina achiziției de conținut salient. Pentru a explora pe deplin structura cascadei și explicabilitatea rezumatului raportului radiologic, introducem două inovații. În primul rând, proiectăm o abordare în doi pași: rezumarea extractivă urmată de rezumarea abstractivă. În al doilea rând, în plus, împărțim partea extractivă în două sarcini independente: extragerea frazelor saliente (1) și (2) cuvinte cheie. Experimentele efectuate pe un set de date de rapoarte radiologice disponibile publicului arată că abordarea noastră nouă conduce la un rezumat mai precis comparativ cu liniile de referință cu un singur pas și cu două etape cu un singur proces extractiv, cu o îmbunătățire generală a scorului F1 de 3-4%.', 'sr': 'IMPRESSIONS dio radiološkog izveštaja o ispitivanju zamišljanja je s a žetak razuma i zaključaka radiologa, a to takođe pomaže predlažeći liječniku u potvrđivanju ili isključivanju određenih dijagnoza. Kaskadu zadataka je potrebna za automatski proizvedenje abstraktivnog sažetka tipičnog izveštaja o radiologiji bogatih informacija. Ovi zadaci uključuju prikupljanje saliènog sadržaja iz izveštaja i generacije konkretnog, lako potrošljivog dijela IMPRESSIONA. Prije istraživanja o sažetaciji izveštaja radiologije usredotočena je na jednokorak do kraja modele -- koji potpišu zadatak prikupljanja salijenog sadržaja. Da bi potpuno istražili strukturu kaskade i objašnjivost sažetka izveštaja radiologije, predstavljamo dve inovacije. Prvo, dizajniramo dva koraka pristup: ekstraktivna sažetka nakon apstraktivne sažetke. Drugo, dodatno razbijamo ekstraktivni deo u dva nezavisnog zadatka: izvlačenje salijanta (1) rečenica i (2) ključnih reči. Eksperimenti o javno dostupnim radiološkim izveštajima pokazuju da naš novi pristup vodi do preciznije sažetke u usporedbi s jednokorakom i dva koraka sa jednoekstraktivnim osnovnim linijama procesa s ukupnim poboljšanjem u rezultatu F1 od 3-4%.', 'no': 'IMPRESSIONS-delen av ein radiologisk rapport om ein studie på bilete er ein samandrag av radiologsargumentet og konklusjonar, og det også hjelper refererande legen for å bekrefta eller unngå nokre diagnoser. Ein kaskade av oppgåver er nødvendig for å automatisk laga ein abstraktiv samandrag av den typiske informasjonsrike radiologiske rapporten. Desse oppgåvene inkluderer henting av salient innhald frå rapporten og generering av ein konkis, enkelt brukbart IMPRESSIONS-avdeling. Førre forskning om sammendraging av radiologiske rapporten har fokusert på enkelt steg end-to-end-modeller, som undersøker oppgåva til innteken av salient innhald. For å fullstendig utforske kaskadstrukturen og forklaringa av sammendrag av radiologiske rapporter, introduserer vi to inovasjonar. Først designerer vi ein to steg tilnærming: ekstraktiv sammendrag etter abstraktiv sammendrag. Andre, vi deler ekstraktivt del til to uavhengige oppgåver: utpakking av salient (1) setningar og (2) nøkkelord. Eksperimentar på ein offentlig tilgjengeleg radiologisk rapport- datasett viser at den noverande tilnærminga vår fører til ein meir nøyaktig sammendrag samanlikna med enkelt steg og to steg med enkelt ekstraktiv prosess- baselinjer med en generell forbedring i F1- poeng med 3- 4 %.', 'si': "The IMPRESSIONS part of a radio ology report on an imag study is a summary of the radio ologist's Reasoning and Concludions, and it is as well assists the referenring doctor in verifing or extinguishing Certe Diagonals. සාමාන්\u200dය තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණ වාර්තාවික වාර්තාවේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාලිකාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න කාස්කේඩ් එක අ මේ වැඩසටහන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වාර්තාව සහ පරීක්ෂණයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dර රේඩියෝජික වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණය ගැන ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය තමයි ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරධාන විද කැස්කේඩ් සංවිධානය සහ රේඩියෝජිවිධානය වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපි අවස්ථාන මුලින්ම, අපි පැත්තෙන් දෙකක් වින්යාස කරනවා: ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සංශ්\u200dයාත්මක සංශ්\u200dයාත්මක ප දෙවෙනි වෙනි වෙනි වෙනි වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කොටස් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් පිටවෙනවා: සිල ප්\u200dරජාතික වාර්තාවික වාර්තාවික වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධයෙන් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ වාර්තාවික වාර්තාව පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ සංචාරයක් තරම්", 'so': "Qaybta wargelinta sawirida ah ee IMPRESSIONS waa muhiim ka ah sababta iyo dhamaadka fardiologiga, sidoo kale waxay caawinaysaa dhakhtarka loo soo jeedo si uu u xaqiijiyo ama ka gaaro waqtiga cayiman. Shaqooyinka waxaa loo baahan yahay in lagu sameeyo wargelinta taariikhda ee macluumaadka ee caadiga ah ee taajirka ah. Shaqooyinkaasu waa in laga helo macluumaad ku saabsan wargelinta iyo barbaarinta isbitaal ah oo si fudud u isticmaali karo. Waxbarashada hore oo ku qoran taariikhda wargelinta fardijiyada ayaa focus ugu saaray modelal hal-step-to-ugu-dhammaad- kaasoo hoos u dhigta shaqada heshiiska waxyaabaha ku jira. Si aad u baahan karto dhismaha cascadda iyo faa'iidada wargelinta radiologyo oo summarinta ah, waxaan soo bandhigaynaa laba abuur ah. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu qoraynaa qaab laba dabar ah: xarunta dhaqdhaqaalaha ee la soo saaray, waxaana soo raacay dhamaystirka aan waxtar lahayn. Second, qeybta la saaro waxaan ku burburinayaa laba shaqo oo xor ah: soo bixinta xarunta (1) iyo hadallada (2). Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka taariikhda ee dadweynaha ah waxay muujiyaan qaababka warqadda ee warqadda ah oo aad u sahlan, taasoo la barbardhiga kooxaha kooxaha F1-4 boqolkiiba oo hal qad ah iyo labo-step oo hal-extractive ah.", 'sv': 'Avsnittet IMPRESSIONER i en radiologisk rapport om en bildstudie är en sammanfattning av radiologens resonemang och slutsatser, och det hjälper också den hänskjutande läkaren att bekräfta eller utesluta vissa diagnoser. En kaskad av uppgifter krävs för att automatiskt generera en abstraktiv sammanfattning av den typiska informationsrika radiologiska rapporten. Dessa uppgifter inkluderar förvärv av framträdande innehåll från rapporten och generering av en kortfattad, lätt förbrukningsbar IMPRESSIONS sektion. Tidigare forskning om sammanfattning av radiologiska rapporter har fokuserat på enstaka steg end-to-end modeller -- som undersummerar uppgiften för framträdande innehållsförvärv. För att fullt ut utforska kaskadstrukturen och förklarbarheten av sammanfattning av radiologiska rapporter introducerar vi två innovationer. Först utformar vi ett tvåstegssätt: extraktiv sammanfattning följt av abstraktiv sammanfattning. För det andra bryter vi dessutom ner den extraktiva delen i två oberoende uppgifter: extraktion av framträdande (1) meningar och (2) nyckelord. Experiment på ett allmänt tillgängligt dataset för radiologiska rapporter visar att vårt nya tillvägagångssätt leder till en mer exakt sammanfattning jämfört med baslinjer i ett och två steg med en extraktiv process med en övergripande förbättring av F1-poäng på 3-4%.', 'ta': 'ஒரு படம் படிப்பை பற்றி ஒரு ரேடியோஜி அறிக்கையின் IMPRESSIONS பாகம் ஒரு சுருக்கமாகும் ரேடியோஜியலின் காரணங்கள் மற்றும் முடிவுகளின் சுருக்கம், மற்றும் அத இயல்பான தகவல்- rich ரேடியோஜி அறிக்கையின் சுருக்கத்தை தானாகவே உருவாக்க வேண்டிய பணிகளின் பாக்கேட் தேவைப்படுகிறது. @ info ஆராய்ச்சி அறிக்கையின் முன்னிருப்பு ஆராய்ச்சி சுருக்கம் ஒற்றைபடி முடிவு முடிவு மாதிரிகளின் மாதிரிகளின் மீது கவனம நாம் இரண்டு புதிய கண்டுபிடிப்புகளை முழுமையாக ஆரம்பிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் வானியல் அறிக்கையின் விளக்கமுடியாத முதலில், நாம் இரண்டு படி செயல்படுத்தலை வடிவமைக்கிறோம்: வெளியேற்ற சுருக்கம் பின்னர் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட சுருக்கம இரண்டாவது, நாம் வெளியீட்டு பகுதியை இரண்டு சுதந்திரமான வேலைகளாக முறித்து விடுவோம்: வாய்ப்பு (1) வாக்குகளை வெளியேற்றுதல ஒரு பொதுவான கிடைக்கும் ரேடியோ அறிக்கை தகவல் அமைப்பின் முன்னோட்டம் எங்கள் புதிய முறைமையை ஒற்றைபடி ஒப்பிடும் இரண்டு படிகளுடனும் ஒற்றை வெளியேற்றும் செயல் அடிப', 'ur': 'ایک تصویر کی تحقیق کے بارے میں ایک راڈیولوژی راپورت کی IMPRESSIONS بخشی راڈیولوژس کے منطق اور نتیجے کا ایک ذریعہ ہے، اور یہ بھی ایک دکتر کی تصدیق کرنے یا خارج کرنے کے لئے مدد کرتا ہے. کاموں کی کاسکے کی ضرورت ہے کہ عادت معلومات-ثروت راڈیولوژی راپورٹ کی آزمائش کی آزمائش کرے۔ ان کاموں میں ایک قسم کی راپورت اور نسل کی آسانی طرح مصرف حاصل کرنے والی IMPRESSIONS قسم کے سائل موجود منصفات حاصل کرنا ہے. راڈیولوژی راپورت کے ذریعے پہلے تحقیق ایک سپے پائیں-پائیں-پائیں-پائیں موڈل پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے، جسے سلیٹ منصوبے حاصل کرنے کے کام کے ذریعے ذخیره کرتا ہے. کاسکاڈ ساختار اور راڈیولوژی راپورٹ جمع کرنے کے قابل توضیح کے لئے، ہم دو نوآوریوں کو معلوم کرتے ہیں۔ پہلے، ہم ایک دو قدم کے تقریبا طراحی کرتے ہیں: اخلاقی ترکیب کی تعریف کے بعد اخلاقی ترکیب کی تعریف کے ساتھ۔ دوسرا، ہم اضافہ کے ساتھ اضافہ حصہ کو دو مستقل کاموں میں تقسیم کرتے ہیں: سلیٹ (1) کلمات اور (2) کلمات اضافہ کرنا۔ ایک ظاہری راڈیولوژی راپورٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کی تجربیات ہماری روزنامہ طریقہ کو دکھاتی ہے کہ ایک سٹے کے مقابلہ میں ایک سٹے اور دو سٹے کے ساتھ ایک استعمال کے بئس لین کے ساتھ ہماری روزنامہ طریقہ سے زیادہ مضبوط ترکیب کرتا ہے جو F1 سٹے میں 3-4 درجے کی عم', 'uz': "Rasm tahrirchi haqida Radiologiya haqida IMPRESSIONS qismlari radiologist sabablari va ishi haqida hisoblanadi. Bu huddi bu doktorini tasdiqlash yoki bir necha diagnozni tasdiqlash uchun yordam beradi. @ info: whatsthis @ info @ info To ʻliq qidirish uchun, radiologiya haqida qisqarishni aniqlash uchun biz ikkita ijodkorni anglatamiz. Birinchisi biz ikki darajaga qaramaymiz: tashkilotni tasavvur qilish keyin abstraktiv hisoblash orqali. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz ajratish qismini ikkita oddiy vazifalarga o'tiramiz: salient (1) maxfiy soʻzlarini ajratish va (2) tugmalar soʻzlarini. Name", 'vi': 'Phần phỏng vấn của một báo cáo khoa xạ về một nghiên cứu chụp hình là một tổng hợp lý lẽ và kết luận của nhà khoa xạ trị, và nó cũng giúp cho bác s ĩ người đưa tin để xác nhận hoặc loại bỏ một số chẩn đoán. Cần phải có một tập hợp các việc để tự động tạo ra một bản tóm tắt trừu tượng của báo cáo khoa học giàu thông tin điển hình. Nhiệm vụ này bao gồm việc lấy được nội dung nổi bật từ báo cáo và sản xuất ra một bộ phim ngắn gọn, dễ tiêu chuẩn. Nghiên cứu trước về bản tóm tắt khoa xạ đã tập trung vào các mô- đun cuối cùng (một bước) chứa đựng nhiệm vụ nhận dạng vật chất nổi bật. Để khám phá đầy đủ cấu trúc dây chuyền và khả năng rõ ràng của việc mô phỏng báo cáo quang học, chúng tôi có hai sự phát triển. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi thiết kế một phương pháp hai bước: Bản tóm tắt khai thác, sau đó là tóm tắt trừu tượng. Thứ hai, chúng tôi còn phân loại phần khai thác thành hai nhiệm vụ độc lập: khai thác các câu nổi (1) và (2) từ khoá. Các thí nghiệm trên một tập tin công khai có được trên báo cáo quang học cho thấy cách tiếp cận mới của chúng ta dẫn đến một kết quả tổng quát hơn so với mô-bước và hai bước-một-một-một-một-bóc-tiến-trình nền-ra với một cải tiến tổng thể trong số F1 của 3-4=.', 'bg': 'Разделът ВЪЗДЕЙСТВА на рентгенологичен доклад за образно изследване е обобщение на аргументите и заключенията на рентгенолога, а също така помага на препращащия лекар да потвърди или изключи определени диагнози. Необходима е каскада от задачи, за да се генерира автоматично абстрактно резюме на типичния богат на информация радиологичен доклад. Тези задачи включват придобиване на видно съдържание от доклада и генериране на кратък, лесно консумативен раздел Впечатления. Предишни изследвания на обобщаването на радиологичните доклади са се фокусирали върху едностепенни модели от край до край -- които обхващат задачата за придобиване на видно съдържание. За да проучим напълно каскадната структура и обяснимостта на обобщаването на радиологичните доклади, ние въвеждаме две иновации. Първо, ние проектираме двустепенен подход: екстрактивно обобщаване, последвано от абстрактно обобщаване. Второ, допълнително разделяме извличащата част на две независими задачи: извличане на видни (1) изречения и (2) ключови думи. Експериментите с обществено достъпни данни от рентгенологични доклади показват, че новият ни подход води до по-прецизно обобщение в сравнение с базовите линии с едностепенен и двустепенен процес с цялостно подобрение на оценката от 3-4%.', 'nl': 'Het gedeelte IMPRESSIES van een radiologisch rapport over een beeldvormend onderzoek is een samenvatting van de redenering en conclusies van de radioloog, en het helpt de verwijzende arts ook bij het bevestigen of uitsluiten van bepaalde diagnoses. Een cascade van taken is vereist om automatisch een abstracte samenvatting te genereren van het typische informatierijke radiologische rapport. Deze taken omvatten het verwerven van opvallende inhoud uit het rapport en het genereren van een beknopte, gemakkelijk te consumeren sectie IMPRESSIES. Voorafgaand onderzoek naar samenvatting van radiologische rapporten heeft zich gericht op single-step end-to-end modellen, die de taak van het verwerven van opvallende inhoud subsumeren. Om de cascadestructuur en verklarbaarheid van de samenvatting van radiologische rapporten volledig te onderzoeken, introduceren we twee innovaties. Eerst ontwerpen we een twee-staps aanpak: extractieve samenvatting gevolgd door abstractieve samenvatting. Ten tweede splitsen we het extractieve deel op in twee onafhankelijke taken: extractie van opvallende (1)zinnen en (2) trefwoorden. Experimenten op een publiek beschikbare radiologie rapport dataset tonen aan dat onze nieuwe aanpak leidt tot een nauwkeurigere samenvatting in vergelijking met single-step en two-step-with-single-extractive-proces baselines met een algehele verbetering in F1 score van 3-4%.', 'da': 'Afsnittet IMPRESSIONER i en radiologisk rapport om en billeddannelse er et resumé af radiologens ræsonnement og konklusioner, og det hjælper også den henvisende læge med at bekræfte eller udelukke visse diagnoser. Der kræves en kaskade af opgaver for automatisk at generere et abstrakt resumé af den typiske informationsrige radiologiske rapport. Disse opgaver omfatter erhvervelse af vigtigt indhold fra rapporten og generering af en kortfattet, let forbrugervenlig IMPRESSIONS sektion. Tidligere forskning om resuméering af radiologiske rapporter har fokuseret på single-step end-to-end modeller -- som undervurderer opgaven med fremtrædende indholdsindsamling. For fuldt ud at udforske kaskadestrukturen og forklareligheden af radiologisk rapport resuméering, introducerer vi to innovationer. Først designer vi en to-trins tilgang: ekstraktiv opsummering efterfulgt af abstraktiv opsummering. For det andet opdeler vi desuden den ekstraktive del i to uafhængige opgaver: udtrækning af fremtrædende (1) sætninger og (2) nøgleord. Eksperimenter med et offentligt tilgængeligt datasæt af radiologiske rapporter viser, at vores nye tilgang fører til et mere præcist resumé sammenlignet med basislinjer med et enkelt trin og to trin med en enkelt ekstraktiv proces med en samlet forbedring af F1 score på 3-4%.', 'hr': 'IMPRESSIONS dio radiološkog izvješća o ispitivanju slike je s a žetak razuma i zaključaka radiologa, te također pomaže podnositelju liječnika u potvrđivanju ili isključivanju određenih dijagnoza. Kaskadu zadataka je potrebna za automatski proizvedenje apstraktivnog sažetka tipičnog izvješća o radiologiji bogatih informacija. Ovi zadaci uključuju prikupljanje saličnog sadržaja iz izvješća i generacije sekcije konkisa, lako potrošljiva IMPRESSIONS. Prije istraživanja o sažetku izvješća o radiologiji usredotočena je na jednokoračne modele kraja do kraja -- koje podupiruju zadatak prikupljanja salijanog sadržaja. Da bi potpuno istražili strukturu kazade i objašnjivost sažetka izvješća o radiologiji, predstavljamo dvije inovacije. Prvo, dizajniramo dva koraka pristup: ekstraktivna sažetka nakon apstraktivne sažetke. Drugo, dodatno razdvojimo ekstraktivni dio u dva nezavisnog zadatka: izvlačenje salijanta (1) rečenica i (2) ključnih riječi. Iskusi na javno dostupnom prijavu podataka o radiologiji pokazuju da naš novi pristup vodi do preciznijeg sažetka u usporedbi s jednokorakom i dva koraka s jednoekstraktivnim osnovnim linijama procesa s ukupnim poboljšanjem u rezultatu F1-a od 3-4%.', 'de': 'Der Abschnitt IMPRESSIONEN eines radiologischen Berichts über eine bildgebende Studie ist eine Zusammenfassung der Argumentation und Schlussfolgerungen des Radiologen und hilft dem überweisenden Arzt auch, bestimmte Diagnosen zu bestätigen oder auszuschließen. Eine Kaskade von Aufgaben ist erforderlich, um automatisch eine abstraktive Zusammenfassung des typischen informationsreichen Radiologieberichts zu generieren. Zu diesen Aufgaben gehören die Erfassung relevanter Inhalte aus dem Bericht und die Erstellung eines prägnanten, leicht konsumierbaren IMPRESSIONS-Abschnitts. Bisherige Forschung zur Zusammenfassung radiologischer Berichte konzentrierte sich auf einstufige End-to-End-Modelle, die die Aufgabe der Erfassung von salienten Inhalten subsumieren. Um die Kaskadenstruktur und Erklärbarkeit der Zusammenfassung radiologischer Berichte vollständig zu erforschen, stellen wir zwei Innovationen vor. Zunächst entwerfen wir einen zweistufigen Ansatz: extraktive Zusammenfassung gefolgt von abstrakter Zusammenfassung. Zweitens unterteilen wir den extraktiven Teil zusätzlich in zwei unabhängige Aufgaben: Extraktion von auffälligen (1)Sätzen und (2) Schlüsselwörtern. Experimente an einem öffentlich zugänglichen Radiologiebericht zeigen, dass unser neuartiger Ansatz zu einer präziseren Zusammenfassung im Vergleich zu Single-Step- und Two-Step-with-Single-Extractive-Process-Baselines mit einer insgesamt verbesserten F1-Score von 3-4% führt.', 'fa': 'بخشی IMPRESSIONS از گزارش رادیولوژی درباره یک مطالعه تصویر یک جمعیت دلیل و نتیجه\u200cهای رادیولوژی است و همچنین پزشک مربوط به تأیید یا خارج از تشخیص\u200cها کمک می\u200cکند. یک کاسکید از کارها نیاز دارد تا به طور خودکار یک جمعیت abstractive از گزارش رادیولوژی معمولی با اطلاعات ثروتمند تولید کند. این وظیفه\u200cها شامل خریدن محتوای طبیعی از گزارش و نسل یک قسمت قطعی که به آسانی قابل مصرف\u200cکننده IMPRESSIONS است. تحقیقات قبلی در مورد تعداد گزارش رادیولوژی روی مدل\u200cهای پایان و پایان یک مرحله تمرکز شده است، که وظیفه\u200cی گیرنده\u200cی محتویات طبیعی را تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهد. برای تحقیق ساختار کاسکید و توضیح آگهی گزارش رادیولوژی، دو نوآوری را معرفی می کنیم. اول، ما یک دستور دو قدم طراحی می کنیم: جمعیت خارجی که بعد از جمعیت خارجی است. دوم، به اضافه، قسمت خارجی را در دو کار مستقل می\u200cشکنیم: اخراج از جمله\u200cهای خارجی (۱) و (۲) کلید\u200cها. تجربه\u200cهایی در مجموعه داده\u200cهای رادیولوژی که در دسترس عمومی موجود هستند نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور رمانی ما به یک جمع دقیق\u200cتری در مقایسه با یک قدم و دو قدم با یک مرحله\u200cی پایگاه\u200cهای فرایند خارج\u200cکننده با توسعه عمومی در امتیاز F1 ۳-۴%.', 'ko': '영상학 연구에 관한 방사학 보고서의 인상 부분은 방사과 의사의 추리와 결론의 총결로 전진 의사가 일부 진단을 확인하거나 배제하는 데 도움을 준다.전형적인 정보가 풍부한 방사학 보고서를 자동으로 생성하는 추상적인 요약은 일련의 임무가 필요하다.이 작업들은 보고서에서 중요한 내용을 얻고 간결하고 사용하기 쉬운 인상을 만드는 부분을 포함한다.이전에 방사학 보고서 요약에 대한 연구는 주로 단일 단계에서 끝까지의 모델에 집중되었다. 이 모델은 현저한 내용을 포함하는 임무를 포함한다.방사능 보고서 요약의 등급 연결 구조와 해석성을 충분히 탐색하기 위해 우리는 두 가지 혁신을 도입했다.우선, 우리는 두 가지 방법을 설계했다. 그것이 바로 요약을 추출한 다음에 추상적인 요약이다.그 다음에 우리는 추출 부분을 두 가지 독립된 임무로 분해할 것이다. 그것이 바로 두드러진 (1) 문장과 (2) 키워드를 추출하는 것이다.공개된 방사학 보고서 데이터 집합에서의 실험에 따르면 단일 추출 과정의 기선인 단보와 2단계에 비해 우리의 새로운 방법은 더욱 정확하게 정리되었고 F1 점수는 전체적으로 3-4% 높아졌다.', 'id': 'Bagian IMPRESI dari laporan radiologi tentang studi gambar adalah ringkasan dari alasan dan kesimpulan radiolog, dan juga membantu dokter referensi dalam mengkonfirmasi atau mengecualikan diagnosi tertentu. Sebuah kaskade tugas diperlukan untuk secara otomatis menghasilkan ringkasan abstraktif dari laporan radiologi tipis kaya informasi. Tugas-tugas ini termasuk memperoleh isi yang salin dari laporan dan generasi bagian IMPRESI yang singkat, mudah dikonsumsi. Penelitian sebelumnya mengenai perhitungan laporan radiologi telah fokus pada model satu-langkah dari akhir ke akhir -- yang merupakan tugas dari akuisisi isi yang salin. Untuk mengeksplorasi secara penuh struktur kaskade dan penjelasan dari ringkasan laporan radiologi, kami memperkenalkan dua inovasi. Pertama, kita merencanakan pendekatan dua langkah: perhitungan ekstraktif diikuti oleh perhitungan abstraktif. Kedua, kami tambahan memecahkan bagian ekstraktif menjadi dua tugas independen: ekstraksi kalimat salient (1) dan (2) kata kunci. Experiments on a publicly available radiology report dataset show our novel approach leads to a more precise summary compared to single-step and to two-step-with-single-extractive-process baselines with an overall improvement in F1 score of 3-4%.', 'tr': 'IMPRESSIONS bir resim araşdyrmasy hakynda bir radiologiýa raportynyň hasaby radiology ň razylygynyň we çözümleriniň toplamdyr we bu durumda karar çözümlerini tassyklamak ýa-da bellenýän lukmanyň üstine kömek edýär. Name Bu görevler rapordan soňky maksadyň almagyny we samsyklygyň döredilmesinden, a ňsatlyk ulanjagyny IMPRESSIONS bölüminden tapylýarlar. Radiologiýa hasaby barada öňki araştyrmalar ýeke-adım soňra-soňra nusgalaryna üns berildi. Bu süýtgeli maksady alanynyň zadyny süýtgedir. Kaskadyň düzümlerini tamamlamak we radiologiýa hasaplamasynyň düşündirmegi üçin, iki täzelikçilik etmäge rugsat berýäris. Ilkinji gezek, iki adım golaýyny tasarlýarys: taplaýyn taplaýyn soňra taplaýyn soňra taplaýyn taplaýyn. İkinci olarak, ekstraktif bölümünü iki bağımsız görevlere bölüyoruz: salient (1) sözler ve (2) kelime sözler çıkarmak. Halkara bar radiologiýa maglumatyň barlag sapaglarynyň denminatlaryny biziň romanlaryň ýarymyny 1-ýolu we 2-ýolu-ýene-ýene-ýene-ýene-ýene-ýokary proses üýtgetmeli toparyna 3-4% derejesinde düzeltmelidir.', 'sq': 'Seksioni IMPRESIONI i një raporti radiologjik rreth një studimi imazhi është një përmbledhje e arsyetimit dhe përfundimeve të radiologut dhe ndihmon gjithashtu mjekun që referohet në konfirmimin apo përjashtimin e disa diagnozave. Një kaskadë detyrash kërkohen për të gjeneruar automatikisht një përmbledhje abstraktive të raportit tipik të radiologjisë së pasur me informacion. These tasks include acquisition of salient content from the report and generation of a concise, easily consumable IMPRESSIONS section.  Kërkimi i mëparshëm mbi përmbledhjen e raportit radiologjik është përqëndruar në modelet e një hapi nga fundi në fund, të cilat nënkuptojnë detyrën e blerjes së përmbajtjeve të rëndësishme. Për të eksploruar plotësisht strukturën e kaskadës dhe shpjegueshmërinë e përmbledhjes së raportit radiologjik, ne paraqesim dy inovacione. Së pari, ne dizajnojmë një qasje dy hapash: përmbledhje ekstraktive pasuar nga përmbledhje abstraktive. Së dyti, ne përveç kësaj e shpërndajmë pjesën ekstraktive në dy detyra të pavarura: nxjerrjen e fjalëve kryesore (1) dhe (2) fjalëve kyçe. Experiments on a publicly available radiology report dataset show our novel approach leads to a more precise summary compared to single-step and to two-step-with-single-extractive-process baselines with an overall improvement in F1 score of 3-4%.', 'af': "Die UitPRESSIONS-artikel van 'n radiologie-rapport oor 'n beeldestudie is 'n opsomming van die radiologees se redening en conclusies, en dit is ook die verwysing-dokter ondersteun in bevestiging of uitsluit sekere diagnose. 'n Kaskade van taak is benodig om outomaties 'n abstraktiewe opsomming van die tipiese informasie-ryk radiologie raporteer te genereer. Hierdie taak insluit die aankrywing van salient inhoud van die raporteer en generasie van 'n konkis, maklik gebruikbaar IMPRESSIONS-artikel. Vorige ondersoek oor radiologies raportopsomming het op enkel-stap end-to-end-models fokus gegee, wat die taak van salient inhoud aanvang ondersteun. Om die kaskadstruktuur en verduidelikheid van radiologies raportopsomming tot volledig te ondersoek, introduseer ons twee inovaties. Eerste, ons ontwerp 'n twee-stap toegang: ekstraktiewe opsomming volgens abstraktiewe opsomming. Tweede, ons verbreek ook die ekstraktiewe deel in twee onafhanklike opdragte: uitpakking van salient (1) setings en (2) sleutelwoorde. Eksperimente op 'n publiek beskikbaar radiologie-raportstel datastel vertoon ons novele toepassing lei na 'n meer presies opsomming vergelyk met enkel-stap en na twee-stap-met-enkel-ekstraktief-proses-basisline met 'n algemene verbetering in F1 skaal van 3-4%.", 'am': 'የሬዲዮሎጂ ሪፖርት የኢንተርኔት ትምህርት የሬዲዮሎጂ አዋቂ እና የመጨረሻ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ አድራሻ ይህ ስራዎች ከሪፖርት እና ከውይይት ትውልድ ማግኘት በችሎታ የIMPRESSIONS ክፍል አግኝቷል፡፡ የቀድሞው የሬዲዮሎጂ ሪፖርት ማቀናጃ ማስታወቂያው የአንድ ደረጃ መጨረሻ ወደ መጨረሻ ዓይነቶች ላይ ተማክሮአል፤ ይህ የተጨማሪው መረጃ ማግኘት ነው፡፡ የሬዲዮሎጂ ሪፖርት ማስታወቂያውን ለመፍጠር እና ማስታወቂያውን ለማድረግ ሁለት አዲስ ፍጥረትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የሁለት ደረጃዎች አቀማመጥ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ Second, we additionally break down the extractive part into two independent tasks: extraction of salient (1) sentences and (2) keywords.  የሬዲዮሎጂ ሪፖርት ዳታ ማተሚያ ላይ የተፈተና ፈተናዎች የኖሮውን ሥርዓት ወደ አንድ ደረጃ እና ከአንዲት ደረጃ ጋር አንድ-ደረጃ እና በሁለት ደረጃዎች ላይ የተደረገውን የF1 score በ3-4 በመቶኛ ክፍል የሚያሳውቀው የአሁኑን ደረጃ ማሳያየት ይሄዳል፡፡', 'az': 'IMPRESSIONS s əviyyəsi haqqında görüntü təhsil haqqında radioloğunun razılığını və sonuçlarını təsdiqləməsindən və ya bəzi diagnostikaları təsdiqləməsindən istifadə edir. Növbəti informasiyalı radioloji raportunun avtomatik olaraq abstraktiv toplantısını yaratmaq üçün işlərin kaskadı lazımdır. Bu görevlər rapordan və nəsillərindən çəkinmək üçün çox asanlıqla istifadə edə bilən IMPRESSIONS bölümündən istifadə edilir. Radioloji raportu təmizlənməsi haqqında əvvəlki araştırma təmiz-adım end-to-end modellərə odaklanmışdır. Bu, süslü məlumat almasının işini süsləyir. Kascada yapısını tamamlamaq və radioloji raportunun təmizlənməsini təsdiqləmək üçün, iki yenilənməsi təsdiqləyirik. İlk dəfə, iki adım tərzini tasarlayırıq: abstraktiv tərzindən sonra ekstraktif tərzini. İkincisi, biz artıq ekstraktif parçasını iki bağımsız işə bölükləyirik: salient (1) cümlələrin və (2) açar sözlərin çıxarılması. Yaxınlıq verilən radioloji xəbərdarlıq qutusundakı təcrübələr yeni təcrübəmizin bir adım ilə və iki adım-təcrübə-təcrübə təcrübəsi ilə F1 dəyişdirilməsi 3-4 dəyişdirilməsi ilə daha düzgün bir təcrübə göstərir.', 'hy': "Ռադիոլոգիայի ուսումնասիրության մասին արտահայտված ռադիոլոգիայի զեկույցի Իմպրեսիաների բաժինը ռադիոլոգի մտածողությունների և եզրակացությունների համառոտագրություն է, և այն նաև օգնում է վերաբերյալ բժիշկին հաստատել կամ բացառուել որոշ ախտորո Անհրաժեշտ է մի շարք խնդիրներ, որպեսզի ավտոմատ ստեղծվի տիպիկ տեղեկատվական հարուստ ռադիոլոգիական զեկույցի վերացական համառոտագրություն: Այս հանձնարարությունները ներառում են զեկույցը նշանակալի պարունակություն ստանալ և ստեղծել հատուկ, հեշտ օգտագործվող Իմպրեսիաների բաժին: Ռադիոլոգիայի զեկույցի համառոտագրման նախկին հետազոտությունները կենտրոնացել են մի քայլ վերջ-վերջ մոդելների վրա, որոնք ենթադրում են նշանակալի պարունակության ձեռք բերման խնդիրը: To fully explore the cascade structure and explainability of radiology report summarization, we introduce two innovations.  Նախ և առաջ, մենք ստեղծում ենք երկու քայլ մոտեցում' արտադրողական համառոտագրություն, հետո վերացական համառոտագրություն: Second, we additionally break down the extractive part into two independent tasks: extraction of salient (1) sentences and (2) keywords.  Առաջապես հասանելի ռադիոլոգիայի զեկույցի տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր նոր մոտեցումը հանգեցնում է ավելի ճշգրիտ համառոտագրությանը, համեմատած մեկ քայլի և երկու քայլ մեկ արտադրողական գործընթացի հիմնական գծերին, F1-ի արդյունքի ընդ", 'bs': 'IMPRESSIONS dio radiološkog izvješća o ispitivanju slike je s a žetak razuma i zaključaka radiologa, te također pomaže predsjedavajućem liječniku u potvrđivanju ili isključivanju određenih dijagnoza. Kaskadu zadataka je potrebna za automatski proizvedenje abstraktivnog sažetka tipičnog izvješća o radiologiji bogatih informacija. Ovi zadaci uključuju prikupljanje saličnog sadržaja iz izvješća i generacije sekcije konkreta, lako potrošljiva IMPRESSIONS. Prije istraživanja o sažetaciji izvješća o radiologiji usredotočena je na jednokoračne modele kraja do kraja -- koje podupiruju zadatak prikupljanja salijenog sadržaja. Da bi potpuno istražili strukturu kaskade i objašnjivost sažetka izvješća o radiologiji, predstavljamo dvije inovacije. Prvo, dizajniramo dva koraka pristup: ekstraktivna sažetka nakon apstraktivne sažetke. Drugo, dodatno razdvojimo ekstraktivni dio u dva nezavisnog zadatka: izvlačenje salijanta (1) rečenica i (2) ključnih riječi. Eksperimenti o javno dostupnom kompletu podataka o radiologiji pokazuju da naš novi pristup vodi do preciznijeg sažetka u usporedbi s jednokorakom i dva koraka s jednoekstraktivnim osnovnim linijama procesa s ukupnim poboljšanjem u F1 rezultatu od 3-4%.', 'ca': "La secció IMPRESSIONS d'un informe radiològic sobre un estudi d'imatge és un resum del raonament i les conclusions del radiòleg, i també ajuda al metge que fa referència a confirmar o excluir determinats diagnòstics. Es requereix una cascade de tasques per generar automàticament un resum abstracte del típic informe de radiologia rica en informació. Aquestes tasques inclouen l'adquisició de contingut salient de l'informe i la generació d'una secció d'IMPRESSIONS concisa i fàcilment consumible. La recerca anterior sobre el resum dels informes radiològics s'ha centrat en models de etapa a etapa, que sumeixen la tasca de l'adquisició de continguts salients. Per explorar plenament l'estructura de cascade i l'explicabilitat de la resumen dels informes radiològics, introduïm dues innovacions. En primer lloc, dissenyem un enfocament en dos passos: una resumensió extractiva seguida d'una resumensió abstracta. Segon, també dividim la part extractiva en dues tasques independents: extracció de frases salients (1) i (2) paraules clau. Els experiments d'un conjunt de dades d'informes de radiologia públicament disponibles mostran que el nostre nou enfocament condueix a un resum més precis comparat amb un pas únic i a línies de base de dos pas amb un procés únic d'extracció amb una millora global en la puntuació F1 de 3-4%.", 'sw': 'Sehemu ya taarifa ya redio inayohusu utafiti wa picha ni muhtasari wa sababu na hitimisho la mwanaradiologia, na pia inamsaidia daktari anayejiita kuthibitisha au kuondoa mabadiliko fulani. Mafuriko ya kazi yanahitajika kutengeneza muhtasari usio na kibinafsi wa taarifa za redio za kawaida za taarifa zinazotajiri. Kazi hizi zinajumuisha kupata maudhui ya maudhui yanayotokana na ripoti na kizazi cha kipengele kinachotumika kirahisi cha IMPRESSIONS. Utafiti wa awali wa taarifa za redio umejikita kwenye mifano ya mwisho wa hatua moja hadi mwishoni - ambayo inatumia kazi ya kupata maudhui ya maudhui. Ili kutafuta miundombinu ya mabomu na ufafanuzi wa taarifa za redio kwa muhtasari, tunaonyesha ubunifu wawili. First, we design a two-step approach: extractive summarization followed by abstractive summarization.  Pili, kwa mara nyingine tunavunja sehemu ya kutolewa katika kazi mbili huru: utekelezaji wa muuzaji (1) hukumu na maneno (2). Majaribio kwenye taarifa za taarifa za redio zinazopatikana hadharani zinaonyesha hatua yetu ya riwaya inapelekea muhtasari sahihi zaidi ukilinganishwa na hatua moja na hatua mbili yenye michakato ya moja kwa moja yenye maboresho ya jumla katika score ya F1 kwa asilimia 3-4.', 'cs': 'Oddíl IMPRESSIONS radiologické zprávy o zobrazovací studii je shrnutím odůvodnění a závěrů radiologa a také pomáhá předkládajícímu lékaři potvrdit nebo vyloučit určité diagnózy. Pro automatické generování abstraktivního shrnutí typické radiologické zprávy bohaté na informace je vyžadována kaskáda úloh. Mezi tyto úkoly patří získání významného obsahu ze zprávy a vytvoření stručné, snadno spotřební sekce IMPRESSIONS. Předchozí výzkum shrnutí radiologických zpráv se zaměřil na jednostupné end-to-end modely, které subsumují úkol získávání významného obsahu. Abychom mohli plně prozkoumat kaskádovou strukturu a vysvětlitelnost shrnutí radiologických zpráv, představujeme dvě inovace. Nejprve navrhujeme dvoustupňový přístup: extraktivní shrnutí následující abstraktivní shrnutí. Za druhé, extraktivní část dále rozdělíme na dvě nezávislé úkoly: extrakci významných (1) vět a (2) klíčových slov. Experimenty na veřejně dostupném datovém souboru radiologických zpráv ukazují, že náš nový přístup vede k přesnějšímu shrnutí ve srovnání s jednostupnými a dvoustupňovými metodami extrakčního procesu s celkovým zlepšením skóre F1 o 3-4%.', 'et': 'Kujundusuuringu radioloogiaaruande lõik IMPRESSIONID on kokkuvõte radioloogi põhjendustest ja järeldustest ning aitab pöörduval arstil kinnitada või välistada teatud diagnoose. Tüüpilise teaberikka radioloogiaaruande abstraktse kokkuvõtte automaatseks koostamiseks on vaja rida ülesandeid. Need ülesanded hõlmavad aruandest olulise sisu hankimist ja lühikese ja kergesti tarbitava jaotise IMPRESSIONID loomist. Varasemad uuringud radioloogiaaruannete kokkuvõtte kohta on keskendunud üheastmelistele otsast otsani mudelitele, mis hõlmavad silmapaistva sisu omandamise ülesannet. Radioloogiaaruannete kokkuvõtliku kaskaadstruktuuri ja seletatavuse uurimiseks tutvustame kahte uuendust. Esiteks kujundame kaheastmelise lähenemisviisi: ekstraktiv kokkuvõte, millele järgneb abstraktne kokkuvõte. Teiseks jagame ekstraheeriva osa kaheks sõltumatuks ülesandeks: silmapaistvate (1) lausete ekstraheerimine ja (2) märksõnade ekstraheerimine. Avalikult kättesaadavate radioloogiaaruannete andmekogumi eksperimendid näitavad, et meie uudne lähenemisviis annab täpsema kokkuvõtte võrreldes ühe- ja kaheastmelise ekstraktiivse protsessiga, kusjuures F1 skoor on üldiselt paranenud 3–4%.', 'fi': 'Kuvaustutkimusta koskevan radiologisen raportin IMPRESSIONS-osio on yhteenveto radiologin päättelystä ja johtopäätöksistä sekä auttaa lähettävää lääkäriä vahvistamaan tai sulkemaan pois tietyt diagnoosit. Tarvitaan joukko tehtäviä, jotta saadaan automaattisesti abstrakti yhteenveto tyypillisestä runsaasti tietoa sisältävästä radiologisesta raportista. Tällaisia tehtäviä ovat muun muassa merkittävän sisällön hankkiminen raportista ja tiivis, helposti kulutettava IMPRESSIONS-osio. Aiempi tutkimus radiologisten raporttien yhteenvedosta on keskittynyt yhden vaiheen end-to-end-malleihin -- jotka muodostavat merkittävän sisällön hankinnan tehtävän. Tutkimme radiologisten raporttien yhteenvedon kaskadirakenteen ja selittettävyyden perusteellisesti kahdella innovaatiolla. Ensin suunnittelemme kaksivaiheisen lähestymistavan: ekstraktiivinen yhteenveto, jota seuraa abstraktinen yhteenveto. Toiseksi jaottelemme ekstraktiivisen osan kahteen itsenäiseen tehtävään: merkittävien (1) lauseiden ja (2) avainsanojen erottamiseen. Yleisesti saatavilla olevista radiologisista raporteista tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että uusi lähestymistapamme johtaa tarkempaan yhteenvetoon verrattuna yksivaiheisiin ja kaksivaiheisiin yhden uutteen prosessiin ja F1-pisteen kokonaisparannus on 3–4%.', 'bn': 'একটি ছবি গবেষণা সম্পর্কে একটি রেডিও রিপোর্টের IMPRESSIONS বিভাগ হচ্ছে রেডিওলিজিস্টের কারণ ও সমাপ্তির সারসংক্ষেপ, আর এটি নির্দিষ্ট পরীক্ষা নিশ্চিত করে বা  স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তথ্য-সমৃদ্ধ রেডিওলগি রিপোর্টের সার্মার তৈরি করার জন্য একটি ক্যাসেডের ক্যাসেড আবশ্যক। এই কাজগুলোর মধ্যে রয়েছে রিপোর্ট এবং প্রজন্মের কাছ থেকে বেদনাদায়ক বিষয়বস্তু পেতে, সহজে ব্যবহৃত IMPRESSIONS বিভাগ। রেডিওলিজি রিপোর্টের সংক্ষেপের প্রাথমিক গবেষণা একটি ধাপের শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেলের দিকে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে- যা ব্যবস্থার বিষয়বস্ ক্যাস্কেডের কাঠামো সম্পূর্ণ ব্যাখ্যা করার জন্য এবং রেডিওলিজি রিপোর্টের সংক্ষেপের ব্যাখ্যা করার জন্য, আমরা দু প্রথমত, আমরা দুই পদক্ষেপ নির্মাণ করি: এক্সট্রেক্ট সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপ অনুসরণ করেছি। দ্বিতীয়, আমরা বের করে দুই স্বাধীন কাজের মধ্যে অংশটিকে ভেঙ্গে ফেলি: বেলিয়েনের (১) শাস্তি এবং (২) কী শব্দ। একটি প্রকাশ্য বিদ্যমান রেডিওলি রিপোর্ট ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের উপন্যাসের পদক্ষেপ এক ধাপের তুলনায় আর দুটি ধাপের সাথে এক-এক্সট্রেক্টিকেট- এক্', 'jv': 'The EMREESSionsS section of a radically report about an image test is a sum of the rations and conclusions of the radilogist, and it is again to help the reference doktor in confirming or compromising some diagram. UnknownMonitor vendor Awak iki menehi winih nduwé nggawe barang-winih sing paling apik lan nganggo sampeyan, gampang, akeh susahe PASSENS 1 Anyone Digitale Mungkin, awak dhéwé tambah banter winih dhéwé ning acara dadi iki bakal: entèraksi kalem olèh (1) mbukak lan (2) sesilèh User', 'sk': 'Oddelek IMPRESSIONS radiološkega poročila o slikovni študiji je povzetek razlogov radiologa in zaključkov ter pomaga napotitvenemu zdravniku pri potrditvi ali izključitvi določenih diagnoz. Za samodejno ustvarjanje abstraktnega povzetka tipičnega radiološkega poročila, bogatega z informacijami, je potrebna vrsta nalog. Te naloge vključujejo pridobivanje pomembne vsebine iz poročila in ustvarjanje jedrnatega, enostavno potrošnega razdelka IMPRESSIONS. Predhodne raziskave o povzetku radioloških poročil so se osredotočile na enostopenjske modele od konca do konca -- ki zajemajo nalogo pridobivanja izpostavljene vsebine. Za popolno raziskovanje kaskadne strukture in pojasnljivosti povzetka radioloških poročil uvajamo dve inovaciji. Najprej oblikujemo dvostopenjski pristop: ekstraktivno povzetek, ki mu sledi abstraktivno povzetek. Drugič, ekstraktivni del dodatno razdelimo na dve neodvisni nalogi: ekstrakcija pomembnih (1) stavkov in (2) ključnih besed. Poskusi na javno dostopnem naboru podatkov o radioloških poročilih kažejo, da naš nov pristop vodi do natančnejšega povzetka v primerjavi z izhodiščnimi vrednostmi postopka v enem koraku in dveh korakih z enim ekstraktivnim procesom s splošnim izboljšanjem ocene F1 za 3–4%.', 'he': 'החלק ההדגשות של דו"ח רדיולוגי על מחקר דמיון הוא סכם של ההיגיון והמסקנות של הרדיולוג, וזה גם עוזר לרופא המייחס לאישור או להפריד אבחנות מסוימות. נדרש קבוצה של משימות כדי ליצור אוטומטית סכם אסטרקטיבי של דו"ח רדיולוגי עשיר מידע טיפוסי. המשימות האלה כוללות רכישה של תוכן מפתח מהדו"ח ודור של חלק קיצר, שיכול להשתמש בקלות. מחקר קודם על רשימת דו"ח רדיולוגיה התמקד בדוגמנים שלב אחד, שלב אחד, שלב אחד, שלב אחד, שלב אחד, שמעטפים את המשימה של רכישת תוכן מפורסם. כדי לחקור באופן מלא את מבנה הקסקאד והסבירה של סכם הדו"ח רדיולוגי, אנחנו מכירים שני חדשות. First, we design a two-step approach: extractive summarization followed by abstractive summarization.  Second, we additionally break down the extractive part into two independent tasks: extraction of salient (1) sentences and (2) keywords.  ניסויים על קבוצת נתוני רדיולוגיה זמינה לפומבי מראים שהגישה החדשה שלנו מובילה לסיור מדויק יותר בהשוואה לצעד אחד ושלבים שלבים עם תהליך חיצוני אחד עם שיפור כללי בתוצאות F1 של 3-4%.', 'ha': "Babbar da IMPRESSURINS na wani littãfin radiology da aka sanar da wani littafi na fassarar zane, yana ƙarfafa ga fassarar da kuma ƙarshen ƙarshen na yi amfani da kuma yana ƙarfafa da adadin da ake gaya cikin gaskata ko kuma yana cire wasu diagnostics. An buƙata wani kasar aiki dõmin ya ƙãga wani ƙararin da aka farat ɗaya na rubutu na rubutun takardar radiology. Wannan aikin sun ƙunsa da sami tsarin mai salo daga shirin bayani da aka ƙãga wani shirin da aka lissafa, mai sauƙi da mai amfani da shi. Bayan fitina kan mai ƙararin aikin littafin radiology ya fokus a kan motel guda-ƙari-zuwa-ƙarama - wanda ke ƙara aikin sãmun maɓallin sali. To, dõmin a cika jarraba bakin kaskade da bayani na fassarar lãbãrin radiology, za'a ƙara kaskadar biyu. Kayyan da, za'a ƙayyade wata hanyor sauri biyu: Dukkan na, za mu jefa rabon da ke farata zuwa aiki biyu wanda ba su daidaita ba: zartar da salsalon (1) da maganar (2). Tajararin da ke cikin shirin a bayan da ake iya amfani da wajen ranar radiology dataset na nuna mazaɓa na yanzu masu cikin kwanan kwanan zuwa wani muhimmi mai ƙayyade, sammenlikin da aka kamata ta wajen ƙẽtare taki guda da zuwa danna-takis guda-takis na sami da babban improvement cikin score F1-4%.", 'bo': "The IMPRESSIONS section of a radiology report about an imaging study is a summary of the radiologist's reasoning and conclusions, and it also helps the referring physician in confirming or excluding certain diagnoses. སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ཁྱད་དུ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐོག་ལས་བློ་གཏོང་དགོས་པ These tasks include acquisition of salient content from the report and generation of a concise, easily consumable IMPRESSIONS section. སྔོན་གྱི་གཟུགས་བརྙན་ཞུ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ནི་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ནང་དོན་དག་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཞུཊ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་དབྱེ་རིས་དང་སྒྲུང་རྩིས་ཐོག་གསལ་བཤད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་གནད་དོན་དང་། གསར དང་པོ་ནས་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་མཁན་ལྡན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱིབས་ཆོག་འདི་སྟེང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་གཉིས་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་།salient (1) ཚིག Experiments on a publicly available radiology report dataset show our novel approach leads to a more precise summary compared to single-step and to two-step-with-single-extractive-process baselines with an overall improvement in F1 score of 3-4%."}
{'en': 'Letters From the Past Modeling Historical Sound Change Through Diachronic Character Embeddings', 'ar': 'التحليل الدلالي عبر الإنترنت لتقليل زمن الوصول في الحوار الموجه نحو المهام', 'es': 'Análisis semántico en línea para la reducción de la latencia en el diálogo orientado a tareas', 'fr': 'Analyse sémantique en ligne pour réduire la latence dans le dialogue orienté tâches', 'pt': 'Análise semântica on-line para redução de latência no diálogo orientado a tarefas', 'ja': 'タスク指向のダイアログでの遅延削減のためのオンラインセマンティック解析', 'ru': 'Онлайн-семантический разбор для уменьшения задержки в диалоге, ориентированном на задачу', 'hi': 'कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद में विलंबता में कमी के लिए ऑनलाइन शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग', 'zh': '在线语义解析,所以省事迟也', 'ga': 'Parsáil Shéimeantach Ar Líne le haghaidh Laghdú Lagachta in Agallamh atá Dírithe ar Thasc', 'el': 'Ηλεκτρονική Σημαντική Ανάλυση για τη μείωση της καθυστερήσεως σε διάλογο προσανατολισμένο στην εργασία', 'hu': 'Online szemantikus értelmezés a késedelem csökkentésére a feladatorientált párbeszédben', 'ka': 'მომხმარეობის შემცირებისთვის სენტიკური პარამენტიკური შემცირება პარამეტრების დიალოგიში', 'it': 'Analisi semantica online per la riduzione della latenza nel dialogo orientato alle attività', 'kk': 'Тапсырма бағытталған диалогында кейінгі қысқарту үшін онлайн семантикалық талдау', 'lt': 'Semantinis analizavimas internetu siekiant sumažinti užduotims orientuoto dialogo vėlavimą', 'mk': 'Онлајн семантично анализирање за намалување на задачите во дијалогот насочен кон задачите', 'ms': 'Online Semantic Parsing for Latency Reduction in Task-Oriented Dialogue', 'ml': 'ടാസ്ക്- ഒറിനേറ്റ് ചെയ്ത ഡയലോഗില്\u200d ലാറ്റെന്\u200dസി ചുരുക്കുവാനുള്ള ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ', 'mt': 'Analiżi Semantika Online għat-Tnaqqis tal-Latenza fid-Djalogu orjentat lejn ix-Xogħol', 'mn': 'Тапсыг эхлүүлсэн диалогт сайхан багасгах үед онлайн Semantic Parsing for Later Reduction in Task-Oriented Dialog', 'no': 'Internett semantisk tolking for latentreduksjon i oppgåveorientert dialogvindauge', 'pl': 'Analiza semantyczna online na rzecz redukcji opÃ³ÅºnieÅ„ w dialogu zorientowanym na zadania', 'ro': 'Analiza semantică online pentru reducerea latenței în dialogul orientat spre sarcini', 'sr': 'Онлайн семантични анализ за уменчање последње дејалога ориентираног задача', 'si': 'වැඩ- ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවාදයේදී වෙනුවෙන් ලේටින්සි ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා සැමැන්තික විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Xiriiriga internetka ee ku qoran cashuurta', 'sv': 'Semantisk tolkning online för förseningsminskning i uppgiftsorienterad dialog', 'ta': 'பணியில் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடலில் செமான்டிக் குறைக்க இணைய பாடல்', 'ur': 'ٹاکس-اوریٹ دیالگو میں لٹینسی کمٹونس کے لئے آنلاین سیمانٹیک پارسینگ', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chế độ phân tích truyền thuyết trực tuyến cho giảm giờ làm việc hướng dẫn', 'nl': 'Online Semantische Parsing voor Latency Reduction in Taakgerichte dialoog', 'hr': 'Online semantičko analiziranje za smanjenje kasnije u dijalogu orijentiranog zadatka', 'da': 'Online Semantisk fortolkning for reduktion af latens i opgaveorienteret dialog', 'bg': 'Онлайн семантичен анализ за намаляване на закъснението в диалога, ориентиран към задачите', 'ko': '임무를 위한 대화에서 지연을 줄이는 온라인 의미 분석', 'fa': 'پرداخت سیمنتیک آنلاین برای کاهش تاخیر در محاورۀ تاخیر کار', 'id': 'Analisasi Semantik Online untuk Pengurangan Lambat dalam Dialog Berorientasi Tugas', 'de': 'Online Semantic Parsing zur Latenzreduktion im aufgabenorientierten Dialog', 'tr': 'Görniş Opşenler Girişinde Köçürmek üçin Online Semantik Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Online ële semantiese verwerking vir Latency Reduction in Opdrag- Orienteerde Dialoog', 'sq': 'Analizë Semantike në internet për zvogëlimin e vonesës në dialogun e orientuar në punë', 'sw': 'Uchapishaji wa Mtandaoni kwa ajili ya Upunguzi wa Kufuatilia Kutokana na Tajiri', 'bn': 'কাজ- উল্লেখিত ডায়ালগে ল্যাটেন্সি কমান্ডের জন্য অনলাইন সেমান্টিক পার্সিং', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Görüş-Orientli Dialooğunda Sonrakı Keçirmək üçün Online Semantic Analyzing for Latency Reduction in Task-Oriented Dialog', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'bs': 'Online semantičko analiziranje za smanjenje kasnije u dijalogu s orijentacijom zadataka', 'ca': 'Analització Semàtica en línia per a reduir el retard en el diàleg orientat a les tasques', 'cs': 'Online sémantické analýzy pro snížení latence v dialogu orientovaném na úkoly', 'et': 'Veebipõhine semantiline analüüs hilinevuse vähendamiseks ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogis', 'fi': 'Online Semanttinen tarkastelu viiveen vähentämiseksi tehtäväkeskeisessä vuoropuhelussa', 'sk': 'Spletna semantična analiza za zmanjšanje zamudnosti v dialogu, usmerjenem v naloge', 'jv': 'online semanti Parasing kanggo Kebebasan Ketoken in task-Oriented Dialog', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מחקר סמנטי באינטרנט על מנת להפחית התאוחרות בדיולוג ממוקד משימות', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱའི་ལྟ་བུ'}
{'en': 'While a great deal of work has been done on NLP approaches to lexical semantic change detection other aspects of language change have received less attention from the NLP community In this paper we address the detection of sound change through historical spelling We propose that a sound change can be captured by comparing the relative distance through time between the distributions of the characters involved before and after the change has taken place We model these distributions using PPMI character embeddings We verify this hypothesis in synthetic data and then test the methods ability to trace the well known historical change of lenition of plosives in Danish historical sources We show that the models are able to identify several of the changes under consideration and to uncover meaningful contexts in which they appeared The methodology has the potential to contribute to the study of open questions such as the relative chronology of sound shifts and their geographical distribution', 'ar': 'يعين التحليل الدلالي القياسي للمحادثة كلام مستخدم كامل في برنامج قابل للتنفيذ ، وبعد ذلك يتم تنفيذ البرنامج للرد على المستخدم. قد يكون هذا بطيئًا عندما يحتوي البرنامج على مكالمات وظيفية باهظة الثمن. نحن نحقق في فرصة تقليل وقت الاستجابة من خلال التنبؤ باستدعاءات الوظائف وتنفيذها بينما لا يزال المستخدم يتحدث. نقدم مهمة التحليل الدلالي عبر الإنترنت لهذا الغرض ، مع مقياس تقليل زمن الوصول الرسمي المستوحى من الترجمة الآلية المتزامنة. نقترح إطارًا عامًا مع أولًا وحدة تنبؤ مسبقة إلى برنامج تم تعلمها ، ثم استدلال بسيط ولكنه فعال لتحديد البرنامج الفرعي للتنفيذ المبكر. تُظهر التجارب على مجموعتي بيانات SMCalFlow و TreeDST أن نهجنا يحقق تقليلًا كبيرًا في زمن الانتقال بجودة تحليل جيدة ، مع تقليل زمن الوصول بنسبة 30٪ إلى 65٪ اعتمادًا على وقت تنفيذ الوظيفة والتكلفة المسموح بها.', 'es': 'El análisis semántico conversacional estándar mapea una expresión completa del usuario en un programa ejecutable, después de lo cual el programa se ejecuta para responder al usuario. Esto puede ser lento cuando el programa contiene llamadas a funciones costosas. Investigamos la oportunidad de reducir la latencia mediante la predicción y ejecución de llamadas a funciones mientras el usuario sigue hablando. Presentamos la tarea del análisis semántico en línea para este propósito, con una métrica de reducción de latencia formal inspirada en la traducción automática simultánea. Proponemos un marco general con primero un módulo de predicción de prefijo a programa aprendido, y luego una heurística de umbrales simple pero efectiva para la selección de subprogramas para la ejecución temprana. Los experimentos en los conjuntos de datos SMCalFlow y TreeDst muestran que nuestro enfoque logra una gran reducción de la latencia con una buena calidad de análisis, con una reducción de la latencia del 30 al 65% según el tiempo de ejecución de la función y el costo permitido.', 'fr': "L'analyse sémantique conversationnelle standard mappe un énoncé utilisateur complet dans un programme exécutable, après quoi le programme est exécuté pour répondre à l'utilisateur. Cela peut être lent lorsque le programme contient des appels de fonction coûteux. Nous étudions la possibilité de réduire la latence en prédisant et en exécutant des appels de fonction pendant que l'utilisateur parle encore. Nous introduisons la tâche d'analyse sémantique en ligne à cette fin, avec une métrique de réduction de latence formelle inspirée de la traduction automatique simultanée. Nous proposons un cadre général avec d'abord un module de prédiction préfixe-programme appris, puis une heuristique de seuillage simple mais efficace pour la sélection de sous-programmes en vue d'une exécution anticipée. Des expériences sur les ensembles de données SMCalFlow et TreeDST montrent que notre approche permet une réduction importante de la latence avec une bonne qualité d'analyse, avec une réduction de la latence de 30\xa0% à 65\xa0% en fonction du temps d'exécution de la fonction et du coût autorisé.", 'pt': 'A análise semântica conversacional padrão mapeia um enunciado completo do usuário em um programa executável, após o qual o programa é executado para responder ao usuário. Isso pode ser lento quando o programa contém chamadas de função caras. Investigamos a oportunidade de reduzir a latência prevendo e executando chamadas de função enquanto o usuário ainda está falando. Para isso, introduzimos a tarefa de análise semântica online, com uma métrica formal de redução de latência inspirada na tradução automática simultânea. Propomos uma estrutura geral com primeiro um módulo de previsão prefixo para programa aprendido e, em seguida, uma heurística de limiar simples, mas eficaz, para seleção de subprograma para execução inicial. Experimentos nos conjuntos de dados SMCalFlow e TreeDST mostram que nossa abordagem alcança grande redução de latência com boa qualidade de análise, com uma redução de latência de 30% a 65%, dependendo do tempo de execução da função e do custo permitido.', 'ja': '標準的な会話セマンティック構文解析は、完全なユーザー発話を実行可能プログラムにマッピングし、その後、プログラムはユーザーに応答するように実行されます。これは、プログラムに高価な関数呼び出しが含まれている場合、遅くなる可能性があります。ユーザーがまだ話している間に関数呼び出しを予測して実行することで、待ち時間を短縮する機会を調査します。私たちは、同時機械翻訳に触発された正式な待ち時間削減メトリックを使用して、この目的のためのオンラインのセマンティック解析のタスクを紹介します。最初に学習されたプレフィックスからプログラムへの予測モジュールを備えた一般的なフレームワークを提案し、次に、早期実行のためのサブプログラム選択のための単純でありながら効果的なしきい値ヒューリスティックを提案します。SMCalFlowおよびTreeDSTデータセットの実験によると、当社のアプローチは、機能の実行時間と許容コストに応じて、30%～ 65%のレイテンシ削減を実現し、優れた解析品質で大幅なレイテンシ削減を実現します。', 'hi': 'मानक संवादात्मक शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग एक निष्पादन योग्य प्रोग्राम में एक पूर्ण उपयोगकर्ता उच्चारण को मैप करता है, जिसके बाद प्रोग्राम को उपयोगकर्ता को जवाब देने के लिए निष्पादित किया जाता है। यह धीमा हो सकता है जब प्रोग्राम में महंगी फ़ंक्शन कॉल होती है। हम उपयोगकर्ता अभी भी बोल रहा है, जबकि फ़ंक्शन कॉल की भविष्यवाणी और निष्पादन करके विलंबता को कम करने के अवसर की जांच करते हैं। हम इस उद्देश्य के लिए ऑनलाइन शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग का कार्य पेश करते हैं, एक औपचारिक विलंबता कमी मीट्रिक के साथ एक साथ मशीन अनुवाद से प्रेरित है। हम पहले एक सीखा उपसर्ग-से-प्रोग्राम भविष्यवाणी मॉड्यूल के साथ एक सामान्य ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और फिर प्रारंभिक निष्पादन के लिए उप-प्रोग्राम चयन के लिए एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी थ्रेशोल्डिंग हेरिस्टिक। SMCalFlow और TreeDST डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण अच्छी पार्सिंग गुणवत्ता के साथ बड़ी विलंबता में कमी प्राप्त करता है, जिसमें फ़ंक्शन निष्पादन समय और अनुमत लागत के आधार पर 30% -65% विलंबता में कमी होती है।', 'zh': '格会话语义析将完用户语映可执行程序中,然后执行程序以应用户。 当程序包含昂贵之函数调用,或为迟也。 论在用户言,占行函数调以省迟延。 引入在线语义解析务,给受同声传译启迟减指标。 建一通用框架,先用学者前缀至程占模块,然后简而效阈值启发式,施于子程序择而早行之。 于 SMCalFlow 、 TreeDST 数集上之实验明,吾法以良解析成大幅降迟,以函数行时许之本,迟降 30%–65%。', 'ru': 'Стандартный разговорный семантический синтаксический анализ отображает полное высказывание пользователя в исполняемую программу, после чего программа выполняется для ответа пользователю. Это может быть медленно, когда программа содержит дорогие вызовы функций. Мы изучаем возможность уменьшить задержку, предсказывая и выполняя вызовы функций, пока пользователь все еще говорит. Для этого мы вводим задачу онлайн-семантического синтаксического анализа с формальной метрикой уменьшения задержки, вдохновленной синхронным машинным переводом. Мы предлагаем общий фреймворк с первым изученным модулем предсказания с префиксом к программе, а затем простую, но эффективную эвристику пороговых значений для выбора подпрограмм для раннего выполнения. Эксперименты с наборами данных SMCalFlow и TreeDST показывают, что наш подход обеспечивает значительное сокращение задержки с хорошим качеством синтаксического анализа, с уменьшением задержки на 30%–65% в зависимости от времени выполнения функции и допустимой стоимости.', 'ga': "Má dhéantar parsáil shéimeantach chomhrá caighdeánach a léarscáileann an t-úsáideoir iomlán i gclár inrite, agus ina dhiaidh sin déantar an clár a fhorghníomhú chun freagairt don úsáideoir. D'fhéadfadh sé seo a bheith mall nuair a bhíonn glaonna feidhm daor sa chlár. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar an deis latency a laghdú trí ghlaonna feidhme a thuar agus a fhorghníomhú agus an t-úsáideoir fós ag labhairt. Tugaimid isteach an tasc a bhaineann le parsáil shéimeantach ar líne chun na críche seo, le méadrach foirmiúil laghdaithe an fholaice spreagtha ag aistriúchán comhuaineach meaisín. Molaimid creat ginearálta ina mbeidh modúl réamh-mheasta réamhfhoclach-go-clár foghlamtha ar dtús, agus ansin heorastúil tairseach simplí ach éifeachtach maidir le roghnú fochláir le haghaidh cur i gcrích go luath. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí SMCalFlow agus TreeDST go n-éiríonn lenár gcur chuige laghdú mór foighne le caighdeán maith parsála, le laghdú folaigh 30%–65% ag brath ar am feidhmithe feidhme agus costas ceadaithe.", 'ka': 'სტანდარტური კონტაქტიური სმენტიური პარალიზაციის მარტიკები გამოყენებელი გამოყენებელი პროგრამის შემდეგ პროგრამის გამოყენება გამოყენებელისთვის. ეს შეიძლება იყოს მარტივი, როდესაც პროგრამის შესახებ ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ფუნქციური გახსნა. ჩვენ შევაკეთებთ შესაძლებლობა, რომ გადავიწყებთ და გამოყენებთ ფუნქციის გამოსახულებას, როდესაც მომხმარებელი მუშაობს. ჩვენ ამ მიზეზისთვის ინტერნეტიკური სენმანტიკური პარასტის დავაყენებთ, რომელიც ფორმალური დამატებული მეტრიკური დამატებული სენმანტიკური მანქანის გაგრძნობით ჩვენ პროგრამის წინასწარმოდგინეთ საერთო პროგრამის წინასწარმოდგინეთ პროგრამის წინასწარმოდგინეთ პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის პროგრამის განსაზღვრება, და შემდეგ SMCalFlow და TreeDST მონაცემების გამოცდილებები ჩვენი პროგრამის დიდი შემცირებით გააკეთება, რომელიც საუკეთესო გააკეთება, 30%-65%-ის შემცირებით გააკეთებული ფუნქციის გამოყენების დროზე და შესა', 'el': 'Η τυπική σημασιολογική ανάλυση συνομιλίας χαρτογραφεί μια πλήρη έκφραση χρήστη σε ένα εκτελέσιμο πρόγραμμα, μετά το οποίο το πρόγραμμα εκτελείται για να ανταποκριθεί στο χρήστη. Αυτό θα μπορούσε να είναι αργό όταν το πρόγραμμα περιέχει ακριβές κλήσεις λειτουργίας. Ερευνούμε την ευκαιρία να μειώσουμε την καθυστέρηση με την πρόβλεψη και εκτέλεση κλήσεων λειτουργίας ενώ ο χρήστης εξακολουθεί να μιλάει. Παρουσιάζουμε το έργο της επιγραμμικής ανάλυσης για το σκοπό αυτό, με μια τυπική μέτρηση μείωσης της καθυστέρησης εμπνευσμένη από την ταυτόχρονη μηχανική μετάφραση. Προτείνουμε ένα γενικό πλαίσιο με πρώτα μια μαθημένη ενότητα πρόβλεψης προ-προγράμματος, και στη συνέχεια μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική heuristik για την επιλογή υποπρογραμμάτων για την έγκαιρη εκτέλεση. Τα πειράματα στα σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει μεγάλη μείωση καθυστέρησης με καλή ποιότητα ανάλυσης, με μείωση της καθυστέρησης 30%-65% ανάλογα με το χρόνο εκτέλεσης της λειτουργίας και το επιτρεπόμενο κόστος.', 'hu': 'A szabványos beszélgetési szemantikai elemzés egy teljes felhasználói kimondást leképez egy futtatható programba, amely után a program végrehajtásra kerül, hogy válaszoljon a felhasználónak. Ez lassú lehet, ha a program drága funkcióhívásokat tartalmaz. Megvizsgáljuk a késleltetés csökkentésének lehetőségét a funkcióhívások előrejelzésével és végrehajtásával, amíg a felhasználó beszél. Ebből a célból bemutatjuk az online szemantikai elemzés feladatát, egy formális késleltetéscsökkentő metriával, amelyet a szimultán gépi fordítás ihletett. Általános keretrendszert javasolunk először egy tanult előtag-program előrejelzési modullal, majd egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony heurisztikával az alprogram kiválasztásához a korai végrehajtás érdekében. Az SMCalFlow és TreeDST adatkészleteken végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk nagy késleltetési csökkentést ér el jó elemzési minőséggel, 30%-65%-os késleltetési csökkentést biztosít a funkcióvégrehajtási időtől és az engedélyezett költségektől függően.', 'it': "L'analisi semantica conversazionale standard mappa un'espressione completa dell'utente in un programma eseguibile, dopo di che il programma viene eseguito per rispondere all'utente. Questo potrebbe essere lento quando il programma contiene chiamate di funzioni costose. Investighiamo l'opportunità di ridurre la latenza predicendo ed eseguendo chiamate di funzione mentre l'utente sta ancora parlando. A questo scopo introduciamo il compito di analisi semantica online, con una metrica formale di riduzione della latenza ispirata alla traduzione automatica simultanea. Proponiamo un framework generale con prima un modulo di previsione prefix-to-program appreso, e poi un euristico di thresholding semplice ma efficace per la selezione dei sottoprogrammi per l'esecuzione anticipata. Gli esperimenti sui dataset SMCalFlow e TreeDST mostrano che il nostro approccio raggiunge una grande riduzione della latenza con una buona qualità di analisi, con una riduzione della latenza del 30%-65% a seconda dei tempi di esecuzione delle funzioni e dei costi consentiti.", 'kk': 'Стандартты конвертациялық семантикалық талдау карталары пайдаланушының толық сөздерін орындалатын бағдарламаға орындалады. Содан кейін бағдарлама пайдаланушыға жауап беру үшін орындалады. Бұл бағдарлама үлкен функцияларды шақыру болғанда баяу болуы мүмкін. Біз пайдаланушы әлі сөйлейтінде, функцияларды таңдау және орындау мүмкіндігін шектеп береміз. Бұл мақсат үшін онлайн семантикалық талдау тапсырмасын келтіреміз, бір-бірінші машинаны аудару үшін официалдық кеңістік метрикалық түсірілген. Біз бірінші бағдарламаға үйренген префикс- мен бағдарламаға алдын ала алатын жалпы қоршау модулін ұсынамыз. Содан кейін ішкі бағдарламаларды бастау үшін қарапайым, бірақ ең әсер ет SMCalFlow және TreeDST деректер қорларының тәжірибелері біздің тәжірибеміз жақсы талдау сапасы менен үлкен кездейтін кездейтінін көрсетеді. Функцияларды орындау уақытына тәуелді 30%- 65% кездейтін кездейті', 'mk': 'Стандардно семантично анализирање на разговорите ја мапира целосната израза на корисникот во извршна програма, по која програмата е извршена за да одговори на корисникот. Ова може да биде бавно кога програмата содржи скапи повици на функција. We investigate the opportunity to reduce latency by predicting and executing function calls while the user is still speaking.  Ние ја претставуваме задачата на онлајн семантично анализирање за оваа цел, со формална метрика за намалување на latency инспирирана од истовремен машински превод. Предложуваме генерална рамка со прво научен модул за предвидување од префикс до програма, а потоа едноставен, но ефикасен праг за избор на подпрограми за рано извршување. Експериментите на податоците SMCalFlow и TreeDST покажуваат дека нашиот пристап постигнува големо намалување на латеноста со добар квалитет на анализирање, со намалување на латеноста од 30 до 65 отсто во зависност од времето на извршување на функциите и дозволените трошоци.', 'ms': 'Penghuraian semantik percakapan piawai memetakan ungkapan pengguna lengkap ke dalam program boleh laksana, selepas itu program dilaksanakan untuk menjawab kepada pengguna. Ini boleh lambat bila program mengandungi panggilan fungsi mahal. Kami menyelidiki peluang untuk mengurangi keterlaluan dengan meramalkan dan melaksanakan panggilan fungsi semasa pengguna masih bercakap. Kami memperkenalkan tugas penghuraian semantik online untuk tujuan ini, dengan metrik pengurangan keterlaluan resmi yang diinspirasi oleh terjemahan mesin yang bersamaan. Kami mengusulkan kerangka umum dengan modul ramalan awal-ke-program yang telah belajar, dan kemudian pembatasan heuristik sederhana tetapi efektif untuk pemilihan subprogram untuk pelaksanaan awal. Eksperimen pada set data SMCalFlow dan TreeDST menunjukkan pendekatan kita mencapai pengurangan kelemahan besar dengan kualiti penghuraian yang baik, dengan pengurangan kelemahan 30%-65% bergantung pada masa pelaksanaan fungsi dan biaya dibenarkan.', 'ml': 'പ്രോഗ്രാം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രോഗ്രാമിലേക്ക് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വാക്ക് മാപ്പ് സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡാ പ്രോഗ്രാമില്\u200d വിലയേറിയ ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d വിളിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഇത് പതുക്കെയായിരിക്കും. ഉപയോക്താവ് സംസാരിക്കുമ്പോഴും പ്രവചിക്കുകയും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഫാങ്ഷന്\u200d ഫോള്\u200dണ്\u200d കോള ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ ജോലി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഒരേ സമയത്ത് മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ ആദ്യം പഠിച്ച ഒരു പ്രോഫിക്ക്- ടോ പ്രോഗ്രാം പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന ഘടകം കൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രോഗ്രാം ചെയ്യുന്നു. പിന് എസ്എംകാല്\u200dഫ്ലോവും ട്രീഡിഎസ്റ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നടപടികള്\u200d നല്ല പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്റെ ഗുണവുമായി നല്ല ല ലേറ്റിസ് കുറവ് വരുന', 'mt': 'Analiżi semantika standard ta’ konverżjoni tippjana espressjoni sħiħa tal-utent fi programm eżekuttiv, li wara dan il-programm jiġi eżegwit biex jirrispondi għall-utent. This could be slow when the program contains expensive function calls.  Aħna ninvestigaw l-opportunità li tnaqqas in-nuqqas ta’ dewmien billi nipprojbixxu u nagħmlu sejħiet għall-funzjonijiet waqt li l-utent għadu qed jitkellem. Aħna nintroduċu l-kompitu tal-analizzazzjoni semantika onlajn għal dan l-iskop, b’metrika ta’ tnaqqis formali ta’ latenza ispirata minn traduzzjoni simultanja tal-magni. Aħna nipproponu qafas ġenerali bl-ewwel modulu ta’ tbassir minn qabel għall-programm imgħallem, u mbagħad limitu ewristiku sempliċi iżda effettiv għall-għa żla tas-sottoprogramm għall-eżekuzzjoni bikrija. L-esperimenti fuq is-settijiet tad-dejta SMCalFlow u TreeDST juru li l-approċċ tagħna jikseb tnaqqis kbir ta’ latenza b’kwalità tajba tal-analiżi, bi tnaqqis ta’ 30-65 % ta’ latenza skont il-ħin tal-eżekuzzjoni tal-funzjoni u l-ispiża permessa.', 'no': 'Standard konvertasjon semantisk tolking karterer ein fullstendig brukarnamn i eit program som kan køyrast etter at programmet vert køyrt for å svara på brukaren. Dette kan vera langsomt når programmet inneheld dykka funksjonskallar. Vi undersøker muligheten for å redusera latensitet ved å foregå og køyra funksjonskallar mens brukaren fortsatt snakkar. Vi introduserer oppgåva til internett semantisk tolking for dette målet, med ein formelt reduksjon av latens- metrisk inspirert av samtidig maskinsomsetjing. Vi foreslår ein generell rammeverk med først ein lært prefiks- til- program- forhåndsvisingsmodul, og så ein enkel enn effektivt trådlasting heuristisk for underprogram- utval for tidlegare køyring. Eksperimentane på SMCalFlow og TreeDST-dataset viser at tilnærminga vårt når det gjer stor latentreduksjon med godt tolkingskvalitet, med 30 % og 65 % latentreduksjon avhengig av funksjonskøyringstid og tillatte kostnader.', 'lt': 'Standartinis semantinis pokalbių analizavimas paveikslėlia visapusišką naudotojo išraišką į vykdomąją program ą, po kurios program a vykdoma reaguojant į naudotoją. Tai gali būti lėta, kai programoje yra brangių funkcijų skambučių. We investigate the opportunity to reduce latency by predicting and executing function calls while the user is still speaking.  Šiuo tikslu įdiegiame semantinio analizavimo internetu užduotį su oficialiu latencijos mažinimo metriniu būdu, įkvėpta vienu metu vertant mašiną. Siūlome bendrą sistemą, pirmiausia pasimokytą išankstinio program ų prognozavimo modulį, o vėliau paprastą ir veiksmingą ribinę heuristinę ribinę vertę pasirinkti subprogram ą ankstyvam vykdymui. SMCalFlow ir TreeDST duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų metodas labai sumažina latenciją ir gerą analizavimo kokybę, o latenciją sumažina 30–65 proc., priklausomai nuo funkcijos vykdymo laiko ir leidžiamų sąnaudų.', 'mn': 'Стандарттай ярианы semantic хуваалцах нь хэрэглэгчийн яриаг хэрэглэгчийн хөтөлбөр програм руу хуулбарлаж, хэрэглэгчид хариулах хэрэглэгчийн дараа хөтөлбөр хийгддэг. Программ үнэтэй функцын дуудлага байхдаа бага байж болно. Хэрэглэгчийн ярьж байгаа үед бид хоорондоо хоорондоо зайлсхийг багасгах боломжийг судалж байна. Бид энэхүү зорилго дээр онлайн semantic хуваалцааны даалгаварыг тайлбарлаж, машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын официаллын дараагийн хэмжээг багасгах метрийг илэрхийлж байна. Бид эхлээд суралцагдсан програм руу шийдвэрлэх модультай ерөнхий хэлбэрийг санал болгож, дараа нь ерөнхий үйлдвэрлэх суб-програм сонголтын хувьд энгийн эффект хэлбэртэй хэлбэртэй. SMCalFlow болон TreeDST өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилт нь бидний арга хэмжээнд сайн хуваалцах чадвартай маш том хатуу багасгах боломжтой. Функцийн ажиллах цаг болон боломжтой зардалтай хамааралтай 30%-65%-ын хатуу багасгах болом', 'pl': 'Standardowe parsowanie semantyczne konwersacyjne mapuje pełną wypowiedź użytkownika do programu wykonywalnego, po czym program jest uruchamiany w celu odpowiedzi na użytkownika. Może to być powolne, gdy program zawiera drogie wywołania funkcji. Badamy możliwość zmniejszenia opóźnień poprzez przewidywanie i wykonywanie wywołań funkcji podczas gdy użytkownik jeszcze mówi. Wprowadzamy do tego celu zadanie analizy semantycznej online, z formalną metryką redukcji opóźnień inspirowaną symultanicznym tłumaczeniem maszynowym. Proponujemy ogólny framework z najpierw nauczonym modułem predykcyjnym prefix-to-program, a następnie prostym, ale skutecznym heurystykiem thresholdingu dla wyboru podprogramów do wczesnego wykonania. Eksperymenty na zbiorach danych SMCalFlow i TreeDST pokazują, że nasze podejście osiąga dużą redukcję opóźnień przy dobrej jakości parsowania, przy redukcji opóźnień 30%-65% w zależności od czasu wykonania funkcji i dopuszczonych kosztów.', 'ro': 'Analizarea semantică conversațională standard mapează o expresie completă a utilizatorului într-un program executabil, după care programul este executat pentru a răspunde utilizatorului. Acest lucru ar putea fi lent atunci când programul conține apeluri funcționale scumpe. Investigăm posibilitatea de a reduce latența prin predicția și executarea apelurilor funcționale în timp ce utilizatorul încă vorbește. Introducem sarcina analizării semantice online în acest scop, cu o metrică formală de reducere a latenței inspirată de traducerea automată simultană. Propunem un cadru general cu mai întâi un modul de predicție prefix-la-program învățat și apoi un euristic simplu dar eficient de thresholding pentru selecția subprogramelor pentru executarea timpurie. Experimentele efectuate pe seturile de date SMCalFlow și TreeDST arată că abordarea noastră realizează o reducere mare a latenței cu o calitate bună a analizării, cu o reducere a latenței de 30%-65%, în funcție de timpul de execuție al funcției și costul permis.', 'so': 'Shaqada baaritaanka ee caadiga ah ee la xiriira marka lagu sameeyo qoraal la shaqeeyo oo dhamaan hadal isticmaalayaal ah, taas oo lagu sameeyo barnaamijka si uu ugu jawaabo isticmaalaha. Waxaa suurtagal ah in aad raadsan karto marka uu programu ku jiro telefoonka qiimaha functionada ee qaali ah. Waxaynu baaraynaa fursado in uu soo gaabiyo heerka ugu dambeysashada, marka uu isticmaaluhu weli hadlayo. Shaqada baaritaanka semantika ee internetka ayaannu u bandhignaynaa, taas darteed waxaa lagu soo bandhigayaa tarjumaadka qoraalka ah oo rasmi ah. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa shirkad caadiga ah oo marka ugu horeysa qoraal la barto oo la sii sheegayo programka, dabadeedna waxaa sahlan oo faa’iido ah oo u sahlan in la sameeyo doorashada subprogrammeda. Imtixaanka SMCalFlow iyo TreeDST macluumaadkooda waxay ka muuqataa dhaqdhaqaaqnimadayada waxay gaadhaa hoos u dhaqdhaqaaqi badan oo ay u fududaato qiimo wanaagsan baaritaanka, 30%-65 boqolkiiba waxay ku xiran tahay wakhtiga la qabsado iyo kharashka la ruqsado.', 'sr': 'Standardno konverzacionalno semantičko analiziranje mapira kompletnu izrazu korisnika u program koji se može izvršiti, nakon što se program izvrši kako bi odgovorio na korisnika. Ovo bi moglo biti sporo kada program sadrži skupe pozive za funkciju. Istražujemo priliku da smanjimo latenciju predviđanjem i izvršavamo pozive funkcije dok korisnik još govori. Predstavljamo zadatak internetskog semantičkog analiza za ovu svrhu, sa formalnom metrikom smanjenja latencije inspirisanim istovremenim prevodom mašine. Predlažemo općem okviru sa prvim naučenim modulom predviđanja prefiksa do program a, a zatim jednostavnim i efikasnim prašinama heurističkog izbora podprograma za rano pogubljenje. Eksperimenti o podacima SMCalFlow i TreeDST pokazuju da naš pristup postigne veliku smanjenje latencije sa dobrom kvalitetom analize, sa smanjenjem latencije od 30%-65% ovisnom o vrijeme izvršavanja funkcija i dozvoljenom troškovima.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණික වාර්තාවක සෙමාන්ටික් වාර්තාවක් පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණ භාවිතාකරණය කිරීමට ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් ඇතුලට ප වැඩසටහනේ ගොඩක් වැඩසටහන් කෝල් තියෙනකොට මේක හිම වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න අවස්ථාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජකය තවමත් කතා කරනවා කියලා පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. අපි අන්තර්ජාන සෙමාන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයේ වැඩසටහන් පෙන්වන්නම්, සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ අපි මුලින්ම ඉගෙන ගත්ත ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාමට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාම මොඩ්යුල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාස කරනවා, ඊට ප SMCalFlow සහ TreeDST දත්ත සඳහා පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය හොඳ පරීක්ෂණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ලොකු ප්\u200dරවේ', 'sv': 'Standard konversations semantisk tolkning mappar ett komplett användaruttryck till ett körbart program, varefter programmet körs för att svara på användaren. Detta kan vara långsamt när programmet innehåller dyra funktionssamtal. Vi undersöker möjligheten att minska fördröjningen genom att förutsäga och utföra funktionssamtal medan användaren fortfarande talar. Vi introducerar uppgiften med semantisk tolkning online för detta ändamål, med en formell fördröjningsreduceringsmått inspirerad av simultan maskinöversättning. Vi föreslår ett generellt ramverk med först en lärd prefix-to-program prediktionsmodul, och sedan en enkel men effektiv tröskelheuristik för urval av delprogram för tidig exekvering. Experiment på datauppsättningarna SMCalFlow och TreeDST visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår stor fördröjningsreduktion med god tolkningskvalitet, med en fördröjningsreduktion på 30–65% beroende på funktionskörningstid och tillåten kostnad.', 'ta': 'நிலையான பேச்சான்டிக் பாடல் வரைபடம் முழுமையான பயனர் சொல்லை செயல்படுத்தக்கூடிய நிரலில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட பிறகு பயன்பா நிரலில் செல்லும் செயல்பாடு அழைப்புகளை கொண்டிருக்கும் போது இது மெதுவாக இருக்கலாம். பயனர் இன்னும் பேசுகிறார்கள் போது பார்க்கும் போது முன்னோக்கி மற்றும் செயல்பாடு அழைப்புகளை செயல்படுத்த நாங்கள் இந்த காரணத்திற்காக ஆன்லைன்டின் பாடல் செயலை அறிவிக்கிறோம், ஒரு வடிவமைப்பு லெட்டிக் குறைப்பு மெட்ரிக் அதே போது இய நாம் முதலில் கற்றப்பட்ட முன்னொட்டு முன்னொட்டு நிரல் முன்னொட்டு முன்னொட்டு முன்னொட்டு முன்னோட்டு முன்னோட்டு முன்னோட்டு ம SMCalFlow மற்றும் TreeDST தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் சோதனைகள் செயல்பாட்டு செயல்படுத்தல் நேரத்தை சார்ந்து செயல்படுத்தும் நேரத்தை சார்ந்து செலவு செய்யும் பொருத', 'ur': 'استاندارڈ کانٹروشن سیمنٹی پارسینگ نقشه ایک کامل کارساز کلام کو ایک چلنے والا پروگرام میں ڈال دیتا ہے، اس کے بعد پروگرام کارساز کی جواب دینے کے لئے اجرا کیا جاتا ہے. یہ آسان ہو سکتا ہے جب پروگرام گران فنقش کال لگاتا ہے۔ ہم اس فرصت کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ لٹینٹی کاٹ دینے کے ذریعہ فانس کو پیش بینی اور اجرا کرنے کے ذریعہ فانس کالوں کو کم کریں جب وہ ابھی بات کرتا ہے۔ ہم اس کے لئے آنلاین سیمنٹی پارسینگ کا کام پیش کررہے ہیں، ایک فرمول لاٹینس کم ٹینس میٹریک کے ساتھ ایک دوسرے ماشین ترجمن کے ذریعہ الزام دی جاتی ہے. ہم پہلی بار ایک سیکھی پیش فریکس پر پروگرام کی پیش بینی موڈیل کے ساتھ ایک عمومی فریکس پیش بینی کریں گے، پھر ایک ساده اور اثبات کے ساتھ ایک سوپرگرام کے انتخاب کے لئے ہوریسٹ ڈالنے والا ہے۔ SMCalFlow اور TreeDST ڈاٹ سٹ کے تجربے کی آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری تقریبا بہترین پارسینگ کیفیت کے ساتھ بہت بڑی لاٹینس کاٹ پہنچتی ہے، 30%-65% لاٹینس کاٹ کے ذریعہ فعالیت کی اجازت کے وقت پر اور اجازت کے مطابق۔', 'uz': "Name Dastur qiymati funksiyat telefonlari mavjud boʻlsa, bu sakkiz boʻlishi mumkin. Biz foydalanuvchi ham gapirayotganda ishlatish va bajarish imkoniyatini kamaytirish imkoniyatini aniqlamiz. Biz bu uchun Online semantik parsing vazifasini ko'rib chiqaramiz, bir xil mashina tarjima orqali formal latency metricni kamaytirish mumkin. Biz birinchi o'rganilgan prefix-to-program 预测 moduli bilan bir umumiy freymni tahlil qilamiz, keyin keyin ishga tushirish uchun oddiy va ishlayotgan dasturni tanlash uchun juda foydalanuvchi heuritik. Name", 'vi': 'Bản đồ phân tích tiếng đối thoại tiêu biểu một người dùng hoàn to àn có thể đọc trong chương trình thực thi, sau đó chương trình được thực hiện để đáp ứng người dùng. Việc này có thể chậm khi chương trình chứa các cuộc gọi chức năng đắt tiền. Chúng tôi điều tra cơ hội để giảm tiềm ẩn bằng cách dự đoán và thực hiện các cuộc gọi chức năng trong khi người dùng vẫn đang nói. Chúng tôi xin giới thiệu nhiệm vụ phân tích theo ngữ nghĩa trực tuyến cho mục đích này, với một hệ thống chỉnh sửa chậm trễ được cảm hứng từ phiên bản máy đồng thời. Chúng tôi đề nghị một khung hình chung với một mô- đun dự đoán đầu tiên đầu tiên của đầu tiên đầu tiên đầu tiên đầu tiên đầu tiên đầu tiên. Và sau đó một chế độ xây dựng thần kinh đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả. Thí nghiệm trên các nhà dữ liệu SMCalFlow và TreeDST cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi đạt đến một sự giảm nồng độ phụ, với một chất phân tách tốt, với một 30-65=.=-82* giảm che đậy phụ thuộc vào thời gian thực hiện chức và cho phép chi phí.', 'bg': 'Стандартният семантичен анализ на разговорите картографира пълна потребителска реч в изпълнима програма, след което програмата се изпълнява, за да отговори на потребителя. Това може да бъде бавно, когато програмата съдържа скъпи функции повиквания. Проучваме възможността за намаляване на латентността чрез прогнозиране и изпълнение на повиквания за функции, докато потребителят все още говори. За тази цел въвеждаме задачата за онлайн семантичен анализ с формален метрик за намаляване на латентността, вдъхновен от симултанен машинен превод. Предлагаме обща рамка с научен модул за прогнозиране на префикс към програма, а след това проста, но ефективна гранична евристика за подбор на подпрограми за ранно изпълнение. Експериментите с наборите от данни показват, че нашият подход постига голямо намаляване на латентността с добро качество на анализиране, с 30%-65% намаляване на латентността в зависимост от времето за изпълнение на функцията и позволената цена.', 'hr': 'Standardno konverzacionalno semantičko analiziranje mapira potpunu izrazu korisnika u program izvršenog, nakon kojeg se program izvršava za odgovor na korisnika. To bi moglo biti sporo kada program sadrži skupe funkcionalne pozive. Istražujemo priliku smanjiti latenciju predviđajući i izvršavajući pozive funkcije dok korisnik još uvijek govori. Predstavljamo zadatak internetskog semantičkog razmatranja za ovu svrhu, s formalnim metrijom smanjenja latencije inspiriranim istovremenim prevodom stroja. Predlažemo općem okviru sa prvim naučenim modulom predviđanja prefiksa do program a, a zatim jednostavnim i učinkovitim prašinama heurističkog izbora podprograma za rano izvršenje. Eksperimenti o podacima SMCalFlow i TreeDST pokazuju da naš pristup postigne veliku smanjenje latencije sa dobrom kvalitetom analize, s smanjenjem latencije od 30%-65% ovisnom o vrijeme izvršavanja funkcija i dozvoljenom troškovima.', 'de': 'Standard Conversational Semantic Parsing ordnet eine vollständige Benutzeräußerung in ein ausführbares Programm zu, wonach das Programm ausgeführt wird, um auf den Benutzer zu reagieren. Dies kann langsam sein, wenn das Programm teure Funktionsaufrufe enthält. Wir untersuchen die Möglichkeit, Latenz zu reduzieren, indem wir Funktionsaufrufe vorhersagen und ausführen, während der Benutzer noch spricht. Zu diesem Zweck stellen wir die Aufgabe des semantischen Online-Parsing mit einer formalen Latenzreduktionsmetrik vor, die von der simultanen maschinellen Übersetzung inspiriert ist. Wir schlagen ein allgemeines Framework vor, das zunächst ein gelerntes Präfix-zu-Programm-Vorhersagemodul enthält, und dann eine einfache, aber effektive Thresholding Heuristik für die Auswahl von Unterprogrammen für die frühe Ausführung. Experimente an den SMCalFlow- und TreeDST-Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser Ansatz eine große Latenzreduktion bei guter Parsing-Qualität erreicht, mit einer 30%-65% Latenzreduktion in Abhängigkeit von der Ausführungszeit und den erlaubten Kosten.', 'da': 'Standard conversational semantic parsing kortlægger en komplet brugerudtalelse til et eksekverbart program, hvorefter programmet udføres for at svare på brugeren. Dette kan være langsomt, når programmet indeholder dyre funktionsopkald. Vi undersøger muligheden for at reducere ventetiden ved at forudsige og udføre funktionsopkald, mens brugeren stadig taler. Vi introducerer opgaven med online semantisk parsing til dette formål, med en formel latensreduktionsmetric inspireret af simultan maskinoversættelse. Vi foreslår en generel ramme med først et lært præfiks-til-program forudsigelsesmodul, og derefter en enkel, men effektiv tærskelægning heuristik til udvælgelse af delprogrammer til tidlig udførelse. Eksperimenter med SMCalFlow- og TreeDST-datasættene viser, at vores tilgang opnår en stor ventetid reduktion med god fortolkningskvalitet med en reduktion på 30%-65% afhængig af funktionsudførelsestid og tilladte omkostninger.', 'ko': '표준 세션 의미 분석은 완전한 사용자 언어를 실행 가능한 프로그램에 비추고 이 프로그램을 실행하여 사용자에게 응답합니다.프로그램이 비싼 함수 호출을 포함할 때, 이것은 매우 느릴 수 있습니다.우리는 사용자가 여전히 말을 할 때 예측과 실행 함수 호출을 통해 지연의 기회를 줄이는 것을 연구했다.이를 위해 우리는 온라인 의미 분석의 임무를 도입하고 기계 번역을 동기화하는 것을 영감으로 하여 공식적인 지연 감소 지표를 제시했다.먼저 우리는 간단한 접두사 선택 계발식 프로그램을 제시한 다음에 효과적인 한도값 예측 모듈을 제시했다.SMCalFlow와TreeDST 데이터 집합에서의 실험에 의하면 우리의 방법은 해석의 질이 좋은 상황에서 비교적 큰 지연 감소를 실현했고 함수 실행 시간과 허용된 원가에 따라 지연 감소는 30%-65% 감소했다.', 'nl': 'Standaard conversationele semantische parsing brengt een volledige gebruikersuitspraak in een uitvoerbaar programma, waarna het programma wordt uitgevoerd om te reageren op de gebruiker. Dit kan traag zijn wanneer het programma dure functieoproepen bevat. We onderzoeken de mogelijkheid om latentie te verminderen door functieoproepen te voorspellen en uit te voeren terwijl de gebruiker nog spreekt. We introduceren de taak van online semantische parsing voor dit doel, met een formele latency reduction metric geïnspireerd op simultane machinevertaling. We stellen een algemeen raamwerk voor met eerst een geleerde prefix-to-program voorspellingsmodule, en vervolgens een eenvoudige maar effectieve thresholding heuristiek voor subprogramma selectie voor vroege uitvoering. Experimenten op de SMCalFlow- en TreeDST-datasets tonen aan dat onze aanpak een grote latency reductie bereikt met een goede parsing kwaliteit, met een 30%-65% latency reductie afhankelijk van de uitvoeringstijd van de functie en de toegestane kosten.', 'tr': 'Öň bellenen soňra semantik analyz programi ullanýan üçin ullanýan programde ullanýar. Programiň gymmat funksiýaly çagyrtmaklary barlygy haýal bolup biler. Ullançy heniz gürleýän wagtlary funksiýany çaklamak we işlemek üçin geçişini azaltmak üçin mümkinçiligi barlaýarys. Biz internetden semantik analýşiniň işini bu maksada üçin tanyşdyrýarys. Biraz maşynyň terjimesi tarapyndan gelen formal geçişik metriklerini azaltmak üçin. Biz ilkinji öwrenmeli bir prefiks-tä program a öwrenmeli modul bilen umumy framlaýyn teklip edip, soňra irräk işlemek üçin bir süýşikli we heuristik süýşikli bir süýşikli çizmek üçin bir nusgasyny teklip edip bileris. SMCalFlow we TreeDST veri tesbitleri üzerindeki deneyler gurlumatymyz gowy a ýyşlyk kwaliteti bilen uly azalyşyk bilen, fonksiyonyň işleme wagtyna bağlanýan 30%-65% ýüzüniň azalyşyk we rugsat berilýändigine garaşýar.', 'sw': 'Ramani ya uchimbaji wa sekunde wa mazungumzo ya kawaida ramani ya hotuba kamili ya mtumiaji katika programu inayoendeshwa, ambapo programu imetekelezwa ili kuijibu mtumiaji. This could be slow when the program contains expensive function calls.  Tunatachunguza fursa ya kupunguza hali ya hivi karibuni kwa kutabiri na kutekeleza simu za kazi wakati mtumiaji bado anaongea. Tunaonyesha jukumu la wimbo wa kimapenzi wa mtandaoni kwa lengo hili, kwa kiwango cha kupunguza kiwango rasmi cha hivi karibuni kinachohamasishwa na tafsiri ya mashine kwa wakati mmoja. Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa jumla kwa mara ya kwanza na kituo cha utabiri wa prefix-to-program, na baadae chepesi na yenye ufanisi kwa ajili ya uchaguzi wa programu za chini kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa mapema. Majaribio kwenye seti za data za SMCalFlow na TreeDST zinaonyesha hatua zetu zinafanikiwa kupunguza kwa kiwango kikubwa cha upasuaji, na kupunguza kwa asilimia 30-65 kwa kiwango cha hivi karibuni kinategemea muda wa utekelezaji wa kazi na kuruhusu gharama.', 'id': 'Pemindahan semantis percakapan standar memetakan utteransi pengguna lengkap ke dalam program yang dapat dilaksanakan, setelah mana program dilaksanakan untuk merespon kepada pengguna. Ini bisa lambat ketika program mengandung panggilan fungsi mahal. Kami menyelidiki kesempatan untuk mengurangi keterlaluan dengan memprediksi dan melaksanakan panggilan fungsi sementara pengguna masih berbicara. Kami memperkenalkan tugas penghuraian semantis online untuk tujuan ini, dengan pengurangan keterlaluan formal metrik menginspirasi oleh terjemahan mesin simultan. Kami mengusulkan cadangan umum dengan pertama-tama modul prediksi-ke-program belajar, dan kemudian sederhana namun efektif pembatasan heuristik untuk pemilihan subprogram untuk eksekusi awal. Eksperimen pada dataset SMCalFlow dan TreeDST menunjukkan pendekatan kita mencapai reduksi latensi besar dengan kualitas penghuraian yang baik, dengan 30%-65% reduksi latensi tergantung pada waktu eksekusi fungsi dan biaya yang diizinkan.', 'af': "Standaard omskakelse semantiese verwerking kaarte 'n volledige gebruiker uitdrukking binne 'n uitvoerbare program, nadat die program is uitgevoer na reageer na die gebruiker. Hierdie kan stadige wees wanneer die program bevat koste funksie roep. Ons ondersoek die geleentheid om latensie te verminder deur voorskou en uitvoer funksie roep terwyl die gebruiker nog praat. Ons introduseer die taak van online semantiese verwerking vir hierdie doel, met 'n formeel latensie verduur metrie wat inspireer word deur simultanee masjien vertaling. Ons voorstel 'n algemene raamwerk met eerste 'n leer voorvoegsel- na- program voorskou module, en dan 'n eenvoudig nog effektief drukking heuristiese vir subprogram keuse vir vroeg uitvoering. Experiments on the SMCalFlow and TreeDST datasets show our approach achieves large latency reduction with good parsing quality, with a 30%- 65% latency reduction depending on function execution time and allowed cost.", 'sq': "Analizimi semantik standard i bisedimeve harton një shprehje të plotë të përdoruesit në një program të ekzekutueshëm, pas të cilit programi ekzekutohet për t'u përgjigjur përdoruesit. Kjo mund të jetë e ngadaltë kur programi përmban thirrje të shtrenjta të funksionit. Ne hetojmë mundësinë për të reduktuar vonesën duke parashikuar dhe ekzekutuar thirrjet e funksionit ndërsa përdoruesi është ende duke folur. Ne paraqesim detyrën e analizimit semantik online për këtë qëllim, me një reduktim formal të vonesës metrike frymëzuar nga përkthimi i njëkohëshëm makineri. Ne propozojmë një kuadër të përgjithshëm me së pari një modul parashikimi të mësuar përpara-në-program, dhe pastaj një prag të thjeshtë por efektiv heuristik për zgjedhjen e nënprogramit për ekzekutimin e hershëm. Eksperimentet në grupet e të dhënave SMCalFlow dhe TreeDST tregojnë se qasja jonë arrin reduktim të madh latence me cilësi të mirë analizimi, me një reduktim 30%-65% latence në varësi të kohës së ekzekutimit të funksionit dhe kostos të lejuar.", 'am': 'በተጨማሪው ፕሮግራም በተፈጸመ ጊዜ ፕሮግራሙን ለመቀበል በተጠቃሚ ፕሮግራም የተፈጸመ የስምአኒካ ማህበራዊ ማህበራዊ ስህተት ማህበረሰብ ይፈጸማል፡፡ ፕሮግራሙ የከበረ የфунксия ጥያቄ ሲኖር ይችላል፡፡ ተጠቃሚው ገና ሲናገር የፍቃዱ ጥያቄን በመፍጠር እና በመፍጠር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት የመስመር የsemantic ፓርቲ ስራዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ለመጀመሪያ የተማረ የፕሮግራም ቅድሚያ ፕሮግራም መፍጠር ሞዴል እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ ለቅድሚያ ፕሮግራም መምረጥ የተለየ የአውራሲ ምርጫ ቀላል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የSMCalFlow እና የTreeDST ዳታ ማሳየት ፈተናዎች የቅድመ ቅድሚያ አካሄድን በመልካም ማዘጋጀት እና 30%-65 በመቶ የቅድመ ቅድሚያ ማድረግ በሥርዓት ማድረግ ሰዓት እና ዋጋውን የተፈቀደ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Սովորական խոսակցական սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը քարտեզներ է կատարելագործելի ծրագրի ամբողջ օգտագործողի արտահայտությունը, որից հետո ծրագիրը կատարվում է օգտագործողին պատասխանելու համար: This could be slow when the program contains expensive function calls.  Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք հնարավորությունը նվազեցնել ուշացումը կանխատեսելով և կատարելով ֆունկցիոնալ զանգերը, մինչ օգտագործողը դեռ խոսում է: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք առցանց սեմանտիկ վերլուծության խնդիրը այս նպատակի համար, պաշտոնական ուշացության նվազեցման չափով, ոգեշնչված միաժամանակ մեքենայի թարգմանման միջոցով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ընդհանուր կառուցվածք, որը առաջինը սովորել է նախածրագրի կանխատեսման մոդուլը, հետո պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ սահմանափակում է նախածրագրի ընտրության համար վաղ կատարման համար: SMCAFlow-ի և TreeDST-ի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը հասնում է մեծ ուշացության կրճատում լավ վերլուծության որակով, 30-65 տոկոսի ուշացության կրճատում կախված ֆունկցիաների կատարման ժամանակից և թույլատրված արժեքը:', 'fa': 'بررسی semantic گفتگوی استاندارد نقشه\u200cهای کاربر کامل را در برنامه\u200cای که قابل اجرای اجرای می\u200cشود، می\u200cتواند برنامه را برای پاسخ به کاربر اجرای کند. این می\u200cتواند هنگامی که برنامه با تماس\u200cهای کاربرد گرون باشد آهسته باشد. ما فرصتی را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که با پیش\u200cبینی و اجرای تماس\u200cهای فعالیت در حالی که کاربر هنوز صحبت می\u200cکند کاهش کند. ما وظیفه تجزیه\u200cهای semantic آنلاین را برای این هدف معرفی می\u200cکنیم، با یک منطقه\u200cی کاهش متریک رسمی که توسط ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین همزمان الهام می\u200cدهد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب عمومی با اولین مدول پیشنهاد پیشنهاد پیشنهاد به برنامه یاد گرفته و سپس یک سطح ساده هنوز موثر برای انتخاب زیر برنامه برای اجرای اولیه است. تجربه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای SMCalFlow و TreeDST نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما با کیفیت تقسیم\u200cکننده خیلی بزرگ به دست می\u200cآید، با کاهش 30%-65% latency بستگی به زمان اجرای عملکرد و هزینه\u200cهای اجازه داده می\u200cشود.', 'az': 'İstifadəçiyə cavab vermək üçün proqramın istifadə edilməsi üçün standart müzakirə semantik ayırma xəritələrini icra edilə bilən proqramma içində tamamlayır. Proqramın mal fonksiya çağırışları barəsində yavaş olar. İstifadəçi hələ danışırkən, fərqi çağırışlarını təmin edib, fərqi azaltmaq üçün fərqini incidirik. Biz bu məqsəd üçün onlayn semantik ayırma işini təşkil edirik, birlikdə maşın çevirindən ilham alınan formal latency azaltma metrik ilə. Biz ilk dəfə öyrəndiyimiz prefiks-to-program öyrənmə modulu ilə genel bir frameworku təklif edirik, sonra da ilk icra edilmək üçün çox asanlıq, hətta etkili bir süssül-program seçimi üçün heuristik təklif edirik. SMCalFlow və TreeDST veri qurularında təcrübələr bizim metodumuzun yaxşı analiz kaliteti ilə böyük latenci azaltmasını göstərir, fonksiya işləmə vaxtına bağlı 30%-65% latenci azaltması və müəyyən edilmiş maliyetlərə bağlı olur.', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার্ড আলোচনা সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং মানচিত্র একটি পুরোপুরি ব্যবহারকারীর বক্তব্য একটি প্রোগ্রামে পুরো ব্যবহ প্রোগ্রামের জন্য দামী ফাংশন ফোন আছে তখন এটি ধীরে ধীর হতে পারে। ব্যবহারকারী এখনও কথা বলছেন, আমরা সুযোগ কমানোর সুযোগ অনুসন্ধান করি। এই উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য আমরা অনলাইনের সেমেন্টিক পার্জিং কাজের পরিচয় প্রদর্শন করি, একই সাথে মেশিন অনুবাদের অনুপ্রাপ্ত একটি আনুষ্ঠানিক ল আমরা প্রথমে শিক্ষিত প্রোগ্রামের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী মডিউলের একটি সাধারণ ফ্রেমের প্রস্তাব করি, আর তারপর একটি সাধারণ কার্যকর এবং কার্যকর হিউরিস্টিকে এসএমক্যালফ্লোও এবং ট্রেইডিএসটি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ সাম্প্রতিক সাম্প্রতিক মানের মানে ভালো কমে যায়, যা', 'bs': 'Standardno konverzacionalno semantičko analiziranje mapira kompletnu izrazu korisnika u program koji se izvršava nakon toga, program se izvršava kako bi odgovorio na korisnika. Ovo bi moglo biti sporo kada program sadrži skupe pozive za funkciju. Istražujemo priliku da smanjimo latenciju predviđanjem i izvršavamo pozive funkcije dok korisnik još govori. Predstavljamo zadatak internetskog semantičkog analiza za ovu svrhu, sa formalnim metrijom smanjenja latencije inspirisanim istovremenim prevodom stroja. Predlažemo općem okviru sa prvim naučenim modulom predviđanja prefiksa do program a, a zatim jednostavnim i efikasnim prašinama heurističkog izbora podprograma za rano pogubljenje. Eksperimenti o podacima SMCalFlow i TreeDST pokazuju da naš pristup postigne veliku smanjenje latencije sa dobrom kvalitetom analize, s smanjenjem latencije od 30%-65% ovisnom o vrijeme izvršavanja funkcija i dozvoljenom troškovima.', 'fi': 'Standardi keskustelun semanttinen jäsennys kartuttaa täydellisen käyttäjän lauseen suoritettavaksi ohjelmaksi, jonka jälkeen ohjelma suoritetaan vastaamaan käyttäjää. Tämä voi olla hidasta, kun ohjelma sisältää kalliita toimintopuheluja. Tutkimme mahdollisuutta vähentää viivettä ennustamalla ja suorittamalla toimintopuheluja käyttäjän vielä puhuessa. Tässä tarkoituksessa esittelemme semanttisen verkkoparsauksen tehtävän simultaanisen konekäännöksen inspiroimalla muodollisella viiveen vähennysmittarilla. Ehdotamme yleistä viitekehystä, jossa on ensin opittu etuliite-to-program prediction module, ja sen jälkeen yksinkertainen mutta tehokas kynnysarvo heuristiikka alaohjelman valintaan varhaisessa toteutuksessa. SMCalFlow- ja TreeDST-tietosarjoilla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme vähentää merkittävästi viivettä hyvällä jäsennyslaadulla ja vähentää viivettä 30–65% toiminnon suoritusajasta ja sallituista kustannuksista riippuen.', 'ca': "L'analització semàntica conversacional estàndard mapeix una expressió completa d'usuari en un program a executable, després del qual el programa està executat per respondre a l'usuari. Això podria ser lent quan el programa conté trucades cares de funcions. Investiguem l'oportunitat de reduir la tardivitat predint i executant trucades de funció mentre l'usuari encara parla. We introduce the task of online semantic parsing for this purpose, with a formal latency reduction metric inspired by simultaneous machine translation.  Proposem un marc general amb primer un módul de predicció de prefix a programa aprengut, i després un simple però efectiu umbral heurístic per a la selecció del subprograma per a l'execució precoce. Els experiments dels conjunts de dades SMCalFlow i TreeDST mostren que el nostre enfocament aconsegueix una gran reducció de latència amb bona qualitat d'analització, amb una reducció de latència del 30% al 65% segons el temps d'execució de la funció i el cost permet.", 'cs': 'Standardní konverzační sémantické parsování mapuje kompletní uživatelský výrok do spustitelného programu, po kterém je program spuštěn tak, aby reagoval na uživatele. To může být pomalé, pokud program obsahuje drahé volání funkcí. Zkoumáme možnost snížit latenci předpovídáním a spuštěním funkčních volání, zatímco uživatel stále mluví. Za tímto účelem představujeme úlohu online sémantické parsování s formální metrikou redukce latence inspirovanou simultánním strojovým překladem. Navrhujeme obecný rámec s nejprve naučeným predikčním modulem prefix-to-program a následně jednoduchou, ale efektivní heuristikou thresholdingu pro výběr podprogramu pro včasné provedení. Experimenty na datových sadách SMCalFlow a TreeDST ukazují, že náš přístup dosahuje velké snížení latence při dobré kvalitě parsování, se snížením latence 30%-65% v závislosti na době provedení funkce a povolených nákladech.', 'et': 'Standardne vestlussemantiline parsimine kaardistab täieliku kasutaja väljendi käivitatavasse programmi, mille järel programm käivitatakse kasutajale reageerimiseks. See võib olla aeglane, kui programm sisaldab kulukaid funktsioonikõnesid. Uurime latentsuse vähendamise võimalust funktsioonikõnede prognoosimise ja täitmise kaudu, kui kasutaja veel räägib. Tutvustame sel eesmärgil veebipõhise semantilise parsimise ülesannet, kasutades sünkroontõlkest inspireeritud formaalset latentsuse vähendamise meetrit. Pakume välja üldise raamistiku, millel on esmalt õppitud programmi prefiks-to-programm prognoosimismoodul ja seejärel lihtne, kuid efektiivne piiriheuristika alaprogrammi valimiseks varajaseks täitmiseks. SMCalFlow ja TreeDST andmekogumitega tehtud katsed näitavad, et meie lähenemine vähendab suurt latentsust hea parsimiskvaliteediga, vähendades latentsust 30%-65% sõltuvalt funktsiooni täitmise ajast ja lubatud kuludest.', 'jv': 'ProgressBar Jejaring Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan kanggo mbelak Kasunyatan lan nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang pengguna batasan. Awak dhéwé nggawe nggawe sistem semantar online karo nggawe nggawe tarjamahan kanggo iki dadi, karo pedusikno sistem kuwi arka-pedusikno, pedusikno karo perusahaan sistem sampeyan. We proposal a General frame with first a Learn advance-to-program preview module, and after that a Simple and Efaction threshold heuristical for Subprogram select for first operation. Name', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Wannan yana kasa sako idan shirin ya ƙunsa da wasu kallon masu nau'in aiki. Munã jãyayya fursa da za'a ƙara ƙaranci da za'a yi bayani da kuma a kiyaya kiran idan mai amfani da shi yana bada yi magana. Kayyar da aikin parse na masu semantic a kasar tare da wannan, da wani rabo na ƙara mitric da aka yi wahayi da fassarar mashine masu sami. Tuna goyyar da firam guda na farkon wata shirin bayanin-gabanin-zuwa-program ya sanata, sa'an nan kuma yana da sauri mai sauƙi da inganci wa zaɓen shirin subprogramme don a fara zartar da shi. Experiments on the SMCalFlow and TreeDST datasets show our approach achieves large latency reduction with good parsing quality, with a 30%-65% latency reduction depending on function execution time and allowed cost.", 'sk': 'Standardno pogovorno semantično razčlenjevanje preslika celotne uporabniške izjave v izvedljiv program, po katerem se program izvede, da se odzove na uporabnika. To je lahko počasno, če program vsebuje drage funkcijske klice. Raziskujemo možnost zmanjšanja latence s predvidevanjem in izvajanjem funkcijskih klicev, medtem ko uporabnik še govori. V ta namen predstavljamo nalogo spletnega semantičnega razčlenjanja s formalno meritvijo zmanjšanja latence, ki jo navdihuje simultani strojni prevod. Predlagamo splošni okvir z najprej naučenim modulom predpone do programa, nato pa preprosto, a učinkovito mejno heuristiko za izbiro podprogramov za zgodnjo izvedbo. Poskusi na naborih podatkov SMCalFlow in TreeDST kažejo, da naš pristop doseže veliko zmanjšanje latence z dobro kakovostjo razčlenitve, z 30-65-odstotnim zmanjšanjem latence, odvisno od časa izvedbe funkcije in dovoljenih stroškov.', 'he': 'מחקר סמנטי שיחה סטנדרטי מפה משתמש מושלם לתוכנית ניתן לבצע, לאחר מכן התוכנית הופעלת כדי להגיב למשתמש. זה יכול להיות איטי כשהתוכנית מכילה שיחות פונקציה יקרות. אנו חוקרים את ההזדמנות להפחית התאונה על ידי חיזוי וביצוע שיחות פונקציה בזמן שהמשתמש עדיין מדבר. אנחנו מציגים את המשימה של בדיקת סמנטית באינטרנט למטרה זו, עם מטריקה רשמית להפחית לאטנציה השראה על ידי תרגום מכונות באופן זמני. אנו מציעים מסגרת כללית עם קודם מודול צפוי מראש לתוכנית למדוע, ואז גבלה פשוטה אבל יעילה היוריסטית לבחירה של תוכנית למבצע מוקדם. ניסויים על קבוצת נתונים SMCalFlow ועTreeDST מראים שהגישה שלנו מגיעה לפחות לאטנציה גדולה עם איכות בדיקת טובה, עם הפחות לאטנציה של 30-65% תלוי בזמן ההוצאה לפונקציה והעלות המאפשרת.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གླེང་སྐད་semantic མིང་དཔྱད་ཀྱིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རུང་བའི་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་ལ་ཡིན་པ བྱ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་པ་དེ་སྐབས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་འདོད་པ་ལས་ཆེད་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དམའ་རུ་གཏོང་བ ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་འགུལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གནང་བ་ཡིན། We propose a general framework with first a learned prefix-to-program prediction module, and then a simple yet effective thresholding heuristic for subprogram selection for early execution. SMCalFlow་དང་TreeDST གནད་སྡུད་ནང་གི་Experiments་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲི་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཚད་ལྡན་དང་མཐར་སྤྲོད་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ལ། མཐའ་རྒྱ་ཚད་ཉེ་གནས་ཚུལ'}
{'en': 'Reducing Position Bias in Simultaneous Machine Translation with Length-Aware Framework', 'ar': 'إثراء البيانات الجدولية لقطات قليلة باستخدام بنى محولات دقيقة الضبط', 'pt': 'Enriquecimento de dados tabulares de poucas fotos usando arquiteturas de transformador ajustadas com precisão', 'fr': "Enrichissement de données tabulaires en quelques prises à l'aide d'architectures de transformateurs affinées", 'es': 'Enriquecimiento de datos tabulares de pocos disparos mediante arquitecturas de transformadores ajustadas', 'ja': '微調整された変圧器アーキテクチャを使用した数少ないショット表形式のデータエンリッチメント', 'hi': 'कुछ शॉट सारणीबद्ध डेटा संवर्धन ठीक ट्यून ट्रांसफार्मर आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग कर', 'zh': '用微调变压器架构者少镜头表格数广之', 'ru': 'Малоударное табличное обогащение данных с использованием тонко настроенных архитектур трансформаторов', 'ga': 'Saibhriú Táblach ar Mhion Urchar ag Úsáid Ailtirí Trasfhoirmeoirí Mionchoigeartaithe', 'ka': 'პატარა სტრაბულური მონაცემების გაზრუქმება', 'el': 'Πίνακας εμπλουτισμού δεδομένων με λίγα πλάνα χρησιμοποιώντας τις εκλεπτυσμένες αρχιτεκτονικές μετασχηματιστών', 'hu': 'Néhány felvétel táblázatos adatbővítés finomhangolt transzformátor architektúrákkal', 'it': 'Arricchimento dei dati tabulari in pochi scatti utilizzando architetture di trasformatori perfezionate', 'kk': 'Кестелер деректерін бағалау', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Penikmatan Data Tabular Beberapa Tembakan menggunakan Arkitektur Transformer Tertunjukan Terbaik', 'ml': 'കുറച്ചു വെടിവെക്കുന്ന ടാബുള്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ എക്സ്മെന്റ്', 'mt': 'L-arrikkiment ta’ Dejta Tabulari bi Ftit Riżultati bl-Użu ta’ Arkitetturi Trasformativi Mhux Irfinati', 'mn': 'Бага зэрэг хүснэгт өгөгдлийн хөгжүүлэлт', 'pl': 'Wzbogacanie danych tabelarnych niewielu ujęć za pomocą precyzyjnie dostrojonych architektur transformatorów', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea datelor tabulare cu puține fotografii utilizând arhitecturi de transformare reglate fin', 'sr': 'Malo snimanja tabularnih podataka koristeći dobre transformacijske arhitekture', 'no': 'Få-skytte tabulatoropplysning av data ved bruk av finnstilte transformeringsarkitektur', 'si': 'ටැබුලර් දත්ත විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න', 'so': 'Enrichment using Fine-Tuned Transformer Architectures', 'sv': 'Få bilder tabulär databerikning med finjusterade transformatorarkitekturer', 'ta': 'குறைந்த- வெட்டி அட்டவணை தகவல் மாற்றும் மாற்று உருவாக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'کم شٹ ٹیبلاری ڈاٹا امنیٹ', 'vi': 'Trình nền Truyền hình ảnh ngắn/ ngắn', 'uz': 'Name', 'nl': 'Enige-shot tabulaire gegevensverrijking met behulp van verfijnde transformatorarchitecturen', 'da': 'Few-Shot tabular databerigelse ved hjælp af finjusterede transformatorarkitekturer', 'bg': 'Обогатяване на таблицарни данни с помощта на фино настроени архитектури на трансформатори', 'hr': 'Malo snimanja tabularnih podataka koristeći dobre transformacijske arhitekture', 'id': 'Pengkaya Data Tabular Beberapa Tembakan Menggunakan Arkitektur Transformer Tersesuai Terbaik', 'de': 'Weniger-Shot-Tabellendatenanreicherung mithilfe fein abgestimmter Transformatorarchitekturen', 'fa': 'افزایش داده\u200cهای تابلوی کمی از استفاده از معمارهای تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cهای نیکو', 'ko': '마이크로 변압기 구조의 소렌즈 표 데이터 농축 사용', 'sw': 'Ukubwa wa taarifa za Tabulu wenye risasi ndogo kwa kutumia Makasiliano ya Tafsiri zilizotiwa vizuri', 'tr': 'Taýdaly Mazmunlar', 'af': 'Fet- Shot Tabulêre Data Verrichting gebruik Fine- Tuned Transformer Architectures', 'am': 'የመድረክ ስም', 'hy': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Few-Shot Tabular Data Enrichment Using Fine-Tuned Transformer Architectures', 'az': 'Qısqa-vurulmuş Tərcümə Veriləri Enrichtingi Yaxşı Tərcümə Arhitektürləri', 'bn': 'সুন্দর- ট্রান্সভেন্ডের অনুবাদ ব্যবহার করে অল্প-শুট ট ট্যাবুলের তথ্য বিদায়', 'bs': 'Malo snimanja tabularnih podataka koristeći dobre transformacijske arhitekture', 'ca': 'Enriqueciment de dades tabulars fets amb poques fotos utilitzant arquitectures de transformació finament adaptades', 'cs': 'Obohacení tabulkových dat pomocí jemně vyladěných transformátorových architektur', 'et': 'Vähese pildiga tabeliandmete rikastamine, kasutades peen häälestatud transformaatori arhitektuure', 'fi': 'Muutaman kuvan taulukkotietojen rikastus hienoviritettyjen muuntajien arkkitehtuurien avulla', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'he': 'עשירת מידע טבלונית קטנה באמצעות ארכיטקטורות מעברות מתאימות', 'sk': 'Obogatenje tabelarnih podatkov z uporabo natančno nastavljenih arhitektur transformatorjev', 'bo': 'Few-Shot Tabular Data Enrichment Using Fine-Tuned Transformer Architectures'}
{'en': 'Simultaneous machine translation (SiMT) starts translating while receiving the streaming source inputs, and hence the source sentence is always incomplete during translating. Different from the full-sentence MT using the conventional seq-to-seq architecture, SiMT often applies prefix-to-prefix architecture, which forces each target word to only align with a partial source prefix to adapt to the incomplete source in streaming inputs. However, the source words in the front positions are always illusoryly considered more important since they appear in more prefixes, resulting in position bias, which makes the model pay more attention on the front source positions in testing. In this paper, we first analyze the phenomenon of position bias in SiMT, and develop a Length-Aware Framework to reduce the position bias by bridging the structural gap between SiMT and full-sentence MT. Specifically, given the streaming inputs, we first predict the full-sentence length and then fill the future source position with positional encoding, thereby turning the streaming inputs into a pseudo full-sentence. The proposed framework can be integrated into most existing SiMT methods to further improve performance. Experiments on two representative SiMT methods, including the state-of-the-art adaptive policy, show that our method successfully reduces the position bias and thereby achieves better SiMT performance.', 'ar': 'اكتسب إثراء مجموعات البيانات المجدولة باستخدام مصادر خارجية اهتمامًا كبيرًا في السنوات الأخيرة. ومع ذلك ، فإن الحلول الحالية إما أن تتجاهل البيانات الخارجية غير المهيكلة تمامًا أو تبتكر حلولًا خاصة بمجموعة البيانات. في هذه الدراسة ، اقترحنا التخصيب القائم على المحولات (FeSTE) ، وهو إطار عام وقوي لإثراء مجموعات البيانات الجدولية باستخدام بيانات غير منظمة. من خلال التدريب على مجموعات بيانات متعددة ، يكون نهجنا قادرًا على تطوير نماذج عامة يمكن تطبيقها على مجموعات بيانات إضافية بأقل قدر من التدريب (على سبيل المثال ، عدد قليل من الطلقات). يعتمد نهجنا على تكييف BERT ، والذي نقدم له منهجًا جديدًا للضبط الدقيق يعيد صياغة مجموعات مجموعات البيانات كجمل. يُظهر تقييمنا ، الذي تم إجراؤه على 17 مجموعة بيانات ، أن FeSTE قادرة على إنشاء ميزات عالية الجودة وتتفوق بشكل كبير على حلول الضبط الحالية.', 'fr': "L'enrichissement des ensembles de données tabulaires à l'aide de sources externes a fait l'objet d'une attention particulière ces dernières années. Les solutions existantes, cependant, ignorent complètement les données externes non structurées ou conçoivent des solutions spécifiques aux ensembles de données. Dans cette étude, nous avons proposé FeW-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSte), un cadre générique et robuste pour l'enrichissement d'ensembles de données tabulaires à l'aide de données non structurées. En s'entraînant sur plusieurs ensembles de données, notre approche est capable de développer des modèles génériques qui peuvent être appliqués à des ensembles de données supplémentaires avec un minimum de formation (c'est-à-dire, peu de temps). Notre approche est basée sur une adaptation du BERT, pour laquelle nous présentons une nouvelle approche de réglage fin qui reformule les tuples des ensembles de données sous forme de phrases. Notre évaluation, menée sur 17 ensembles de données, montre que FeSTE est capable de générer des fonctionnalités de haute qualité et de surpasser de manière significative les solutions de réglage fin existantes.", 'es': 'El enriquecimiento de los conjuntos de datos tabulares utilizando fuentes externas ha ganado una atención significativa en los últimos años. Sin embargo, las soluciones existentes ignoran completamente los datos no estructurados externos o diseñan soluciones específicas para conjuntos de datos. En este estudio, propusimos el Enriquecimiento basado en transformadores de pocos disparos (FESTE), un marco genérico y robusto para el enriquecimiento de conjuntos de datos tabulares utilizando datos no estructurados. Mediante la capacitación sobre múltiples conjuntos de datos, nuestro enfoque es capaz de desarrollar modelos genéricos que se pueden aplicar a conjuntos de datos adicionales con una capacitación mínima (es decir, pocos intentos). Nuestro enfoque se basa en una adaptación de BERT, para lo cual presentamos un novedoso enfoque de ajuste que reformula las tuplas de los conjuntos de datos como oraciones. Nuestra evaluación, realizada en 17 conjuntos de datos, muestra que FESTE es capaz de generar funciones de alta calidad y superar significativamente las soluciones de ajuste existentes.', 'pt': 'O enriquecimento de conjuntos de dados tabulares usando fontes externas ganhou atenção significativa nos últimos anos. As soluções existentes, no entanto, ignoram completamente os dados externos não estruturados ou criam soluções específicas para conjuntos de dados. Neste estudo propusemos o Enriquecimento baseado em Transformadores de Poucos Tiros (FeSTE), um framework genérico e robusto para o enriquecimento de conjuntos de dados tabulares usando dados não estruturados. Ao treinar em vários conjuntos de dados, nossa abordagem é capaz de desenvolver modelos genéricos que podem ser aplicados a conjuntos de dados adicionais com treinamento mínimo (ou seja, poucos disparos). Nossa abordagem é baseada em uma adaptação do BERT, para a qual apresentamos uma nova abordagem de ajuste fino que reformula as tuplas dos conjuntos de dados como sentenças. Nossa avaliação, realizada em 17 conjuntos de dados, mostra que o FeSTE é capaz de gerar recursos de alta qualidade e superar significativamente as soluções de ajuste fino existentes.', 'ja': '外部ソースを使用した表形式データセットの充実は、近年大きな注目を集めている。ただし、既存のソリューションは、外部の非構造化データを完全に無視するか、データセット固有のソリューションを設計します。この研究では、非構造化データを使用した表形式データセットのエンリッチメントのための一般的で堅牢なフレームワークであるFew - Shot Transformer Based Enrichment （ FeSTE ）を提案しました。複数のデータセットにわたるトレーニングを行うことで、当社のアプローチは、最小限のトレーニング（すなわち、少数のショット）で追加のデータセットに適用できる一般的なモデルを開発することができます。私たちのアプローチは、BERTの適応に基づいており、そのために、データセットのタプルを文として再構成する新しい微調整アプローチを提示します。17のデータセットで実施された当社の評価では、FeSTEは高品質の機能を生成し、既存の微調整ソリューションを大幅に上回るパフォーマンスを発揮できることが示されています。', 'zh': '近年以来,用外源丰表格数集之法,人情大注。 然今之解决方案,或全忽外非结构化数,或特定于数集之解决方案。 于此论之,盖出于Few-Shot Transformer之扩(FeSTE),此一通强大之框架,用于用非结构化数丰表格数集也。 数集之法,可以通用,可以至少(可以少教)可以数集。 吾法基于BERT改编,为建新声,以数集元组复为句。 吾于17数集之评,FeSTE能成高质量之征,而显优于见调解决方案。', 'hi': 'बाहरी स्रोतों का उपयोग करके सारणीबद्ध डेटासेट के संवर्धन ने हाल के वर्षों में महत्वपूर्ण ध्यान आकर्षित किया है। मौजूदा समाधान, हालांकि, या तो बाहरी असंरचित डेटा को पूरी तरह से अनदेखा करते हैं या डेटासेट-विशिष्ट समाधान तैयार करते हैं। इस अध्ययन में हमने कुछ-शॉट ट्रांसफॉर्मर आधारित संवर्धन (FeSTE) का प्रस्ताव दिया, जो असंरचित डेटा का उपयोग करके सारणीबद्ध डेटासेट के संवर्धन के लिए एक सामान्य और मजबूत ढांचा है। कई डेटासेट पर प्रशिक्षण द्वारा, हमारा दृष्टिकोण जेनेरिक मॉडल विकसित करने में सक्षम है जिसे न्यूनतम प्रशिक्षण (यानी, कुछ-शॉट) के साथ अतिरिक्त डेटासेट पर लागू किया जा सकता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण BERT के अनुकूलन पर आधारित है, जिसके लिए हम एक उपन्यास ठीक-ट्यूनिंग दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो वाक्यों के रूप में डेटासेट के टुपल्स को फिर से तैयार करता है। 17 डेटासेट पर आयोजित हमारे मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि FeSTE उच्च गुणवत्ता वाली सुविधाओं को उत्पन्न करने में सक्षम है और मौजूदा ठीक-ट्यूनिंग समाधानों को काफी बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ru': 'В последние годы значительное внимание уделяется обогащению табличных наборов данных с использованием внешних источников. Однако существующие решения либо полностью игнорируют внешние неструктурированные данные, либо разрабатывают решения для конкретных наборов данных. В этом исследовании мы предложили обогащение на основе малоподвижного трансформатора (FeSTE), общую и надежную структуру для обогащения табличных наборов данных с использованием неструктурированных данных. Обучаясь по нескольким наборам данных, наш подход способен разработать общие модели, которые могут быть применены к дополнительным наборам данных с минимальным обучением (т. е. малочисленным). Наш подход основан на адаптации БЕРТА, для которой мы представляем новый подход к тонкой настройке, который переформулирует кортежи наборов данных как предложения. Наша оценка, проведенная на 17 массивах данных, показывает, что FeSTE способна генерировать высококачественные характеристики и значительно превосходит существующие решения для тонкой настройки.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá aird shuntasach tarraingthe ar shaibhriú na dtacar sonraí táblaí a úsáideann foinsí seachtracha. Déanann réitigh atá ann cheana féin, áfach, neamhaird iomlán a dhéanamh ar shonraí seachtracha neamhstruchtúrtha nó réitigh a bhaineann go sonrach le tacair shonraí a cheapadh. Sa staidéar seo mholamar Few Shot Transformer Saibhriú (FeSTE), creat cineálach agus láidir chun tacair shonraí táblaí a shaibhriú ag baint úsáide as sonraí neamhstruchtúrtha. Trí oiliúint a chur ar thacair sonraí iolracha, tá ár gcur chuige in ann samhlacha cineálacha a fhorbairt a fhéadfar a chur i bhfeidhm ar thacair sonraí breise le hoiliúint íosta (i.e. cúpla seat). Tá ár gcur chuige bunaithe ar oiriúnú BERT, a gcuirimid i láthair cur chuige nua mionchoigeartaithe ina leith a athfhoirmíonn tuples na dtacar sonraí mar abairtí. Léiríonn ár meastóireacht, a rinneadh ar 17 tacar sonraí, go bhfuil FeSTE in ann gnéithe ardchaighdeáin a ghiniúint agus go sáraíonn sé na réitigh mhionchoigeartaithe atá ann cheana.', 'el': 'Ο εμπλουτισμός των πινάκων δεδομένων με τη χρήση εξωτερικών πηγών έχει κερδίσει σημαντική προσοχή τα τελευταία χρόνια. Ωστόσο, οι υπάρχουσες λύσεις είτε αγνοούν εντελώς τα εξωτερικά μη δομημένα δεδομένα είτε επινοούν λύσεις ειδικά για το σύνολο δεδομένων. Στην παρούσα μελέτη προτείναμε τον εμπλουτισμό με βάση τον μετασχηματιστή λίγα πλάνα (ένα γενικό και ισχυρό πλαίσιο για τον εμπλουτισμό των πινάκων δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας μη δομημένα δεδομένα. Με την εκπαίδευση πάνω από πολλαπλά σύνολα δεδομένων, η προσέγγισή μας είναι σε θέση να αναπτύξουμε γενικά μοντέλα που μπορούν να εφαρμοστούν σε πρόσθετα σύνολα δεδομένων με ελάχιστη εκπαίδευση (δηλαδή, λίγες λήψεις). Η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται σε μια προσαρμογή του BERT, για την οποία παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση λεπτομέρειας που επαναδιατυπώνει τα τούβλα των συνόλων δεδομένων ως προτάσεις. Η αξιολόγησή μας, που διεξήχθη σε 17σύνολα δεδομένων, δείχνει ότι η FeSTE είναι σε θέση να παράγει χαρακτηριστικά υψηλής ποιότητας και να ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις υπάρχουσες λύσεις βελτιστοποίησης.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években jelentős figyelmet kapott a táblázatos adatkészletek külső források felhasználásával történő gazdagítása. A meglévő megoldások azonban vagy teljesen figyelmen kívül hagyják a külső strukturálatlan adatokat, vagy adatkészletspecifikus megoldásokat dolgoznak ki. Ebben a tanulmányban a Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE) egy általános és robusztus keretrendszert javasoltunk a táblázatos adatkészletek strukturálatlan adatokkal történő gazdagítására. Több adatkészleten végzett képzéssel megközelítésünk olyan általános modelleket fejleszthet ki, amelyek minimális képzéssel (például néhány lövéssel) alkalmazhatók további adatkészletekre. Megközelítésünk a BERT adaptációján alapul, amelyhez egy új finomhangoló megközelítést mutatunk be, amely az adatkészletek tupleteit mondatként formálja át. 17 adatkészleten végzett értékelésünk azt mutatja, hogy a FeSTE képes kiváló minőségű funkciókat generálni és jelentősen felülmúlni a meglévő finomhangoló megoldásokat.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ წლის შემდეგ გარეშე გამოიყენებული ტაბულური მონაცემების დამატება გარეშე მნიშვნელოვანია. მაგრამ არსებობს გარეშე, ან გარეშე არსტრუქტურებული მონაცემები უკვე იგნორირება ან გარეშე მონაცემების სპექტიფიკური გარეშე. ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ცოტა სტრუქტურაციის განზომილება (FeSTE), სხვადასხვა და ძალიან სტრუქტურაციული კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც არსტრუქტურაციული მონაცემების გამოყენებ მრავალ მონაცემების შესაბამისად, ჩვენი პროგრამა შეუძლია განვითარება გენერიკური მოდელები, რომლებიც შეუძლიათ დამატებული მონაცემების შესაბამისათვის მინიმალური განა ჩვენი პროგორმაცია BERT-ის ადაპტიფიკაციის დაბაზია, რომელიც ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის კონფიგურაციის პროგორმაცია, რომელიც რეფორმეტურაცია მონაცემების კონტულების გა ჩვენი განსაზღვრება, რომელიც 17 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში გავაკეთებულია, რომ FeSTE შეუძლია წარმოიქმნა უფრო კანოლიტური ფუნქციები და ძალიან უფრო გავაკეთებ', 'kk': 'Сыртқы көздерді қолданатын кестелер деректер жиындарын бағалау соңғы жылдарда маңызды болды. Бірақ барлық шешімдері, сыртқы құрылмаған деректерді толық елемейді немесе деректер жиынының ерекше шешімдерін құру. Бұл зерттеулерде біз Кейбір түрлендіруші (FeSTE) негіздеген Жақсарту (FeSTE) дегенді ұсындық, құрылмаған деректерді қолдану үшін кестелер деректер қорларын жақсарту жалпы және құпты қорларын қо Бірнеше деректер қорларын оқыту арқылы, біздің тәсіліміз кеміндетті оқыту арқылы қосымша деректер қорларына қолданылатын жалпы моделдерді жасауға болады. Біздің тәсіліміз BERT адаптациясына негізделген, ол үшін біз деректер қорларының тұлбаларын сұлбалар ретінде реформиретін романдық түзету тәсілігін келтіреміз. 17 деректер қорларында орындалған оқиғамыз, FeSTE сапасы жоғары мүмкіндіктерді құрастырып, барлық жақсы түзету шешімдеріне көп жеткізе алады.', 'it': "L'arricchimento di set di dati tabulari utilizzando fonti esterne ha riscosso notevole attenzione negli ultimi anni. Le soluzioni esistenti, tuttavia, ignorano completamente i dati esterni non strutturati o progettano soluzioni specifiche per il set di dati. In questo studio abbiamo proposto Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE), un framework generico e robusto per l'arricchimento di set di dati tabulari utilizzando dati non strutturati. Attraverso la formazione su più set di dati, il nostro approccio è in grado di sviluppare modelli generici che possono essere applicati a set di dati aggiuntivi con una formazione minima (cioè pochi scatti). Il nostro approccio si basa su un adattamento di BERT, per il quale presentiamo un nuovo approccio di messa a punto che riformula i tuples dei dataset come frasi. La nostra valutazione, condotta su 17 set di dati, mostra che FeSTE è in grado di generare funzionalità di alta qualità e di superare significativamente le soluzioni di fine tuning esistenti.", 'lt': 'The enrichment of tabular datasets using external sources has gained significant attention in recent years.  Tačiau esami sprendimai visiškai ignoruoja išorinius nesukurtus duomenis arba kuria konkrečius duomenų rinkiniui skirtus sprendimus. Šiame tyrime pasiūlėme mažai fotografinių transformatorių pagrįstą praturtinimą (FeSTE), bendrą ir tvirtą lentelių duomenų rinkinių, kuriuose naudojami nesustruktūruoti duomenys, praturtinimo sistemą. Mokydami įvairius duomenų rinkinius, mūsų metodas gali sukurti bendruosius modelius, kurie gali būti taikomi papildomiems duomenų rinkiniams, turintiems minimal ų mokymą (t. y. nedidelį mokymą). Mūsų požiūris grindžiamas BERT pritaikymu, kuriam pristatome naują patobulinimo metodą, kuris persvarsto duomenų rinkinių dublius kaip sakinius. Mūsų atliktas 17 duomenų rinkinių vertinimas rodo, kad FeSTE gali sukurti aukštos kokybės savybes ir gerokai viršyti esamus tobulinimo sprendimus.', 'mk': 'Забогатувањето на табуларните податоци кои користат надворешни извори доби значително внимание во последните години. Сепак, постојните решенија или ги игнорираат надворешните неструктурирани податоци целосно или создаваат решенија специфични за податоците. Во оваа студија предложивме „Малку снимки на трансформер базирано богатство“ (FeSTE), генерална и силна рамка за богатство на табуларни податоци користејќи неструктурни податоци. Со обуката во врска со многуте податоци, нашиот пристап е во можност да развие генерални модели кои може да се применат на дополнителни податоци со минимална обука (т.е. неколку снимки). Нашиот пристап е базиран на адаптација на БЕРТ, за која претставуваме нов пристап за финетизирање кој ги реформира двојните податоци како реченици. Our evaluation, conducted on 17 datasets, shows that FeSTE is able to generate high quality features and significantly outperform existing fine-tuning solutions.', 'ms': 'Pengkaya set data tabular menggunakan sumber luaran telah mendapat perhatian yang signifikan dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Solusi yang wujud, bagaimanapun, sama ada mengabaikan data tidak terstruktur luaran sepenuhnya atau merancang solusi khusus set data. Dalam kajian ini kami melamar Perkaya Berasas Transformer Beberapa Tembakan (FeSTE), kerangka generik dan kuat untuk memperkaya set data tabular menggunakan data tidak terstruktur. Dengan latihan melalui set data berbilang, pendekatan kita mampu mengembangkan model generik yang boleh dilaksanakan pada set data tambahan dengan latihan minimal (iaitu beberapa tembakan). Pendekatan kita berdasarkan penyesuaian BERT, untuk yang mana kita memperkenalkan pendekatan penyesuaian novel yang mengubah dua kali kumpulan data sebagai kalimat. Our evaluation, conducted on 17 datasets, shows that FeSTE is able to generate high quality features and significantly outperform existing fine-tuning solutions.', 'mt': 'L-arrikkiment ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta tabulari li jużaw sorsi esterni kiseb attenzjoni sinifikanti f’dawn l-aħħar snin. Is-soluzzjonijiet eżistenti, madankollu, jew jinjoraw kompletament id-dejta esterna mhux strutturata jew ifasslu soluzzjonijiet speċifiċi għas-sett tad-dejta. F’dan l-istudju pproponejna Enrichment ibbażat fuq Few-Shot Transformer (FeSTE), qafas ġeneriku u robust għall-arrikkiment ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta tabulari bl-użu ta’ dejta mhux strutturata. Permezz ta’ taħriġ fuq settijiet ta’ dejta multipli, l-approċċ tagħna huwa kapaċi jiżviluppa mudelli ġeneriċi li jistgħu jiġu applikati għal settijiet ta’ dejta addizzjonali b’taħriġ minimu (jiġifieri ftit fotografiji). L-approċċ tagħna huwa bbażat fuq adattament tal-BERT, li għalih qed nippreżentaw approċċ ġdid ta’ rfinar li jirriforma d-doppji tas-settijiet tad-dejta bħala sentenzi. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna, imwettqa fuq 17-il sett ta’ dejta, turi li FeSTE huwa kapaċi jiġġenera karatteristiċi ta’ kwalità għolja u jwettaq soluzzjonijiet ta’ rfinar eżistenti b’mod sinifikanti.', 'ml': 'പുറത്തുള്ള സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടാബുള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ സമ്പന്നതയില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ശ്രദ്ധ എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള പരിഹാരങ്ങള്\u200d, പുറത്തുള്ള സംഘടിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുക അല് ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് വെടിയുടെ ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള Enrichment (ഫെസ്റ്റെയിന്\u200dറെ) പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ചു. നിര്\u200dമ്മി പല ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200dക്കുമേല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ പരിശീലനത്തിന് സാധാരണ മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതാ Our approach is based on an adaptation of BERT, for which we present a novel fine-tuning approach that reformulates the tuples of the datasets as sentences.  17 ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നടത്തിയ നമ്മുടെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഫെസ്റ്റി ഉയരത്തിലുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നു എന്', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүд гадаад эх үүсвэрүүдийг ашиглан таблицын өгөгдлийн сангийн багасгал нь маш их анхааралтай болсон. Гэвч Existing шийдэл нь гадаад бүтээгдэхүүний мэдээллийг бүрэн үгүйсгэх эсвэл өгөгдлийн сангийн тодорхой шийдлийг төсөөл. Энэ судалгаанд бид FeSTE-д багтаасан баялаг, хүснэгтийн өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан баялагдсан шинжлэх ухаан өгөгдлийн сангуудыг нэмэгдүүлэх ерөнхий болон хүчтэй хэлбэрийг санал болгосон. Ихэнх өгөгдлийн сангийн сургалтын тулд бидний арга нь бага сургалтын нэмэлт өгөгдлийн сангийн сургалтыг ашиглаж болох ерөнхий загваруудыг хөгжүүлж чадна. Бидний арга хэмжээ нь БЕРТ-ын адилтгалын тусламжтайгаар суурилсан. Энэ арга хэмжээнд бид өгөгдлийн хэмжээсүүдийг өгүүлбэр шинэчлүүлэх шинэ арга хэмжээг үзүүлдэг. 17 өгөгдлийн санд хийгдсэн оценка нь FeSTE-г өндөр чанартай чанарыг бүтээж, суурь шийдвэрлэх шийдвэрлээс илүү их гаргаж чадна.', 'ro': 'Îmbogățirea seturilor de date tabelare utilizând surse externe a câștigat o atenție semnificativă în ultimii ani. Cu toate acestea, soluțiile existente fie ignoră complet datele nestructurate externe, fie concep soluții specifice setului de date. În acest studiu am propus FeSTE (FeSTE), un cadru generic și robust pentru îmbogățirea seturilor de date tabelare folosind date nestructurate. Prin instruirea pe mai multe seturi de date, abordarea noastră este capabilă să dezvoltăm modele generice care pot fi aplicate seturilor de date suplimentare cu instruire minimă (adică, câteva lovituri). Abordarea noastră se bazează pe o adaptare a BERT, pentru care prezentăm o nouă abordare de reglare fină care reformulează tuplele seturilor de date ca fraze. Evaluarea noastră, realizată pe 17 seturi de date, arată că FeSTE este capabilă să genereze caracteristici de înaltă calitate și să depășească semnificativ soluțiile existente de reglare fină.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach znaczącą uwagę zyskało wzbogacanie zbiorów danych tabelarycznych za pomocą źródeł zewnętrznych. Istniejące rozwiązania jednak albo całkowicie ignorują zewnętrzne nieustrukturyzowane dane, albo opracowują rozwiązania specyficzne dla zbioru danych. W niniejszym badaniu zaproponowaliśmy wzbogacenie oparte na transformatorze FeSTE (FeSTE), ogólne i solidne ramy wzbogacania zbiorów danych tabelarycznych przy użyciu danych nieustrukturyzowanych. Dzięki szkoleniu na wielu zbiorach danych, nasze podejście jest w stanie opracować ogólne modele, które mogą być zastosowane do dodatkowych zbiorów danych przy minimalnym szkoleniu (tj. kilku ujęciach). Nasze podejście opiera się na adaptacji BERT, dla którego prezentujemy nowatorskie podejście dostrajające, które przeformułuje kropki zbiorów danych jako zdania. Nasza ocena, przeprowadzona na 17-ciu zbiorach danych, pokazuje, że FeSTE jest w stanie generować wysokiej jakości funkcje i znacznie przewyższać istniejące rozwiązania dostosowania.', 'no': 'Forstørring av tabulatordatasett med eksterne kilder har fått signifikante oppmerksomhet i siste år. Dei eksisterande løysingane er imidlertid anten ignorert eksterne ikkje strukturerte data fullstendig eller opprett datasettspesifikke løysing. I denne studien foreslått vi ein generell og robust rammeverk for å forstørra tabulære datasett ved hjelp av ikkje-strukturerte data. På opplæring over fleire datasett kan tilnærminga vårt utvikle generelle modeller som kan brukast til fleire datasett med minimal opplæring (t.d. få bilete). Tilnærminga vårt er basert på ein tilpassing av BERT, som vi presenterer ein novel fin-tuning tilnærming som reformerer tuplene av dataseta som setningar. Vårt evaluering, gjennomført på 17 datasett, viser at FeSTE kan laga høg kvalitetsfunksjonar og utføre betydelig eksisterande finnstillingsløysing.', 'sr': 'Obogaćanje tabularnih seta podataka koristeći vanjske izvore dobilo je značajnu pažnju u poslednjih godina. Međutim, postojeće rješenja ili ignorišu spoljne ne strukture podatke u potpunosti ili smisli specifične rešenja za set podataka. U ovom ispitivanju smo predložili osnovnu bogatstvo na osnovu "FeSTE", generični i robni okvir za bogatstvo tabularnih seta podataka koristeći neostrukturne podatke. Vežbamo više podataka, naš pristup je u stanju da razvijemo generične modele koje se mogu primjenjivati na dodatne podatake sa minimalnim obukom (tj. nekoliko snimaka). Naš pristup je baziran na adaptaciji BERT-a, za koju predstavljamo novi pristup ispravnoj prilagodbi koji reformiše poklopce podataka kao rečenice. Naša procjena, provedena na 17 podataka, pokazuje da FeSTE može stvoriti visoke kvalitetne funkcije i značajno nadmašiti postojeće ispravne rješenja.', 'so': 'Hodantinimada macluumaadka tababarka ee isticmaalka sourceoyinka dibadda ayaa aad u taxaday sanadkii ugu dambeeyey. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, xalal heysta ama ka jeedi karo macluumaadka dibadda oo aan la dhisnayn dhammaan ama ka sameyn xalal gaar ah oo macluumaadka. Waxbarashadan waxaynu soo jeednay qalabka ku saleysan Few-Shot Transformer (FeSTE), taas oo ah qoraal generic iyo robust ah oo lagu hodanayo taariikhda tababarka lagu isticmaalayo macluumaad aan la dhisay. Waxbarashada ku qoran koorasyada macluumaadka kala duduwan ayaa awoodi kara inuu horumariyo tusaalooyin caadiga ah oo lagu codsan karo sawirada macluumaadka dheeraadka ah oo lagu baran karo waxbarashada ugu yaraan (tusaale ahaan dhawr toobad). Dhaqdhaqaalkayagu waxay ku saleysan tahay bedelka BERT, taas oo aynu u keenno qaab wanaagsan oo hagaajiya qalabka macluumaadka sida garsooridda. Qiimeynteena, ee lagu sameeyay 17 databases, wuxuu muujiyaa in FeSTE awoodo inuu soo saaro qalabka tayada sare iyo in uu si weyn u sameeyo xalal aad u wanaagsan oo ay jiraan.', 'sv': 'Anrikningen av tabelldataset med hjälp av externa källor har fått stor uppmärksamhet under de senaste åren. Befintliga lösningar ignorerar dock helt och hållet externa ostrukturerade data eller utformar dataspecifika lösningar. I denna studie föreslog vi Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE), ett generiskt och robust ramverk för berikning av tabelldata med hjälp av ostrukturerad data. Genom att träna över flera datauppsättningar kan vårt tillvägagångssätt utveckla generiska modeller som kan tillämpas på ytterligare datauppsättningar med minimal utbildning (dvs. få skott). Vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på en anpassning av BERT, där vi presenterar ett nytt finjusterande tillvägagångssätt som omformulerar tuplerna i datauppsättningarna som meningar. Vår utvärdering, utförd på 17 dataset, visar att FeSTE kan generera högkvalitativa funktioner och avsevärt överträffa befintliga finjusterande lösningar.', 'si': 'පුරුද්ගලික මුළුවන් භාවිත කරන්නේ ටැබුල් දත්ත සැට් විශාලනය අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාවක් විසි හැබැයි තියෙන්නේ විස්තරය, එළියේ නිර්මාණය නැති දත්ත සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම නැති විස්තර කරන්න, නැත්නම් දත මේ අධ්\u200dයානයේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කළා FeSTE, සාමාන්\u200dයය සහ ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ටැබුලර් දත්ත සැකස් ව ගොඩක් දත්ත සැට් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න පුළුවන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරධානය පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩේල් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය BERT ගැන සැකසුම් සඳහා අධාරිත වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා නියම සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා දත්ත සේට් ටු අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය, දත්ත සේට් 17 වලින්, පෙන්වන්නේ FeSTE පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සහ විශේෂයෙන් ඉ', 'ta': 'வெளி மூலங்களை பயன்படுத்தி அட்டவணையான தகவல் அமைப்பு இருக்கும் தீர்வுகள், அல்லது வெளி உருவாக்கப்படாத தகவல் முழுமையாக புறக்கணி இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் நாம் சில மாற்று மாற்றும் விண்மீன்மை அடிப்படையான தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்தி உருவாக்கப்படாத தரவுத்தளத்தை செலுத்துவதற்கா பல தரவுத்தளங்கள் மேல் பயிற்சி செய்வதால், எங்கள் முறைமை சிறிய பயிற்சியுடன் கூடுதல் தகவல் அமைப்புகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தலாம் பொதுவான ம எங்கள் வழிமுறை BERT-ன் ஒதுக்கீட்டை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, அதை நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய முன்னேற்றம் செய்கிறோம். இது தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் த 17 தரவுத்தளங்களில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது, பெஸ்டி உயர்தரமான குணங்களை உருவாக்க முடியும் மற்றும் இருக்கும் நல்ல தீர்வு', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں میں تبلیل ڈاٹ سٹ کے ثروت کے ذریعہ بیرون سروروں کے مطابق اضافہ ہوا ہے۔ لیکن موجود حل ہیں، یا بیرونی غیر ساختہ ڈاٹ کو کامل غیر نظر انداز کریں یا ڈاٹ سٹ-خاص حل کا طریقہ کریں. اس مطالعہ میں ہم نے کم-Shot Transformer (FeSTE) کی بنیادی تغییرات (FeSTE) کی پیشنهاد کی، ایک عمومی اور ثابت فرمود کے لئے تابلوری ڈاٹ سٹ کے ثابت کرنے کے لئے۔ بہت سی ڈاٹ سٹ پر آموزش کرنا کے ذریعہ، ہمارا طریقہ بہت سی موڈلیاں ایجاد کر سکتا ہے جو کم ترسین کے ساتھ اضافہ ڈاٹ سٹ پر لازم کر سکتے ہیں (یعنی کم شٹ کے ساتھ). ہمارا طریقہ BERT کے ایک سامان پر بنیاد ہے، جس کے لئے ہم ایک نئی نیک تنظیم طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو ڈیٹسٹ کے ٹوپل کو جماعت کے طور پر تغییر دیتا ہے. ہمارا ارزیابی، 17 ڈیٹ سٹ پر کیا گیا ہے، دکھاتا ہے کہ FeSTE بہت سی کیفیت فوائل پیدا کرسکتا ہے اور بہت اچھی طرح موجود بہت سی تنظیم حل کرسکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Aks holda, tashqi tuzilmagan maʼlumotlarni butunlay eʼtibor berilmasin yoki maʼlumotlar qoidasini aniqlash. Bu tadqida biz asosiy tarjima asosida yaratilgan kuch (FeSTE) yaratishni talab qildik, tuzilmagan maʼlumot yordamida tabulyasi maʼlumotlar sonlarini yoyish uchun umumiy va robot freymi. Koʻp nechta maʼlumotlar satrlaridan o'rganish orqali, bizning usuli yaratish mumkin, qoʻshimcha maʼlumotlar satrlariga qoʻshish mumkin (masalan, kichkina foydalanish mumkin). Bizning fikrimiz BERT ta'minlovchisi asosida, biz bu yerda maʼlumotlar satrlarining tugmasini bir so'zlar sifatida o'zgartirib chiqarishga yordam yaxshi ko'rinishimiz mumkin. Bizning qiymatlarimiz 17 maʼlumotlar saqlarida bajarilgan, FeSTE yuqori sifatini yaratish mumkin va mavjud yaxshi suhbat usullarni juda muhim bajarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc làm giàu các tập tin trên bảng dùng nguồn tin bên ngoài đã gây chú ý nhiều trong những năm gần đây. Tuy nhiên, các giải pháp hiện có hoặc bỏ qua các dữ liệu không xây dựng bên ngoài hoặc tìm ra giải pháp cụ thể. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống làm giàu có có trên cơ sở biến hình "Vài Shot", một cơ sở rộng và vững chắc để làm giàu dữ liệu trên bảng, sử dụng dữ liệu không xây dựng. Bằng việc huấn luyện trên nhiều tập tin, phương pháp của chúng ta có thể phát triển các mô hình mẫu chung có thể được áp dụng cho các tập tin bổ sung với mức độ chuẩn tối thiểu (v.d., ít trường quay). Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta dựa trên một sự thích nghi của BERT, vì đó chúng ta giới thiệu một phương pháp mới tinh chỉnh lại các mặc đồ của các tập tin như các câu. Sự đánh giá của chúng tôi, được tiến hành trên bộ dữ liệu 17, cho thấy FeStevie có khả năng tạo ra các tính năng chất cao và hoàn thiện kết quả.', 'bg': 'Обогатяването на таблични набори от данни, използващи външни източници, привлече значително внимание през последните години. Съществуващите решения обаче или игнорират напълно външните неструктурирани данни, или разработват специфични решения за набора от данни. В това проучване ние предложихме обогатяване на базата на няколко трансформатора (FeSTE), обща и стабилна рамка за обогатяване на таблични набори от данни, използващи неструктурирани данни. Чрез обучение върху множество набори от данни, нашият подход е в състояние да разработи генерични модели, които могат да бъдат приложени към допълнителни набори от данни с минимално обучение (т.е. няколко кадъра). Нашият подход се основава на адаптация на БРТ, за която представяме нов подход за фина настройка, който реформира туплите на наборите от данни като изречения. Нашата оценка, проведена на 17 набора от данни, показва, че е в състояние да генерира висококачествени функции и значително да превъзхожда съществуващите решения за фина настройка.', 'hr': 'Obogaćanje tabularnih seta podataka koristeći vanjske izvore dobilo je značajnu pažnju u posljednjih godina. Međutim, postojeće rješenja ili ignorirati spoljne nestrukturirane podatke potpuno ili smisliti specifične rješenja podataka. U ovom ispitivanju smo predložili osnovu bogatstva (FeSTE) na osnovu malog transformatora, općenitog i snažnog okvira za bogatstvo tabularnih seta podataka s neostrukturovanim podacima. Obučavajući više podataka, naš pristup je u mogućnosti razviti generične modele koje se mogu primjenjivati na dodatne podatake s minimalnim obukom (tj. malo snimanja). Naš pristup je temeljen na adaptaciji BERT-a, za koju predstavljamo novi pristup ispravnoj prilagodbi koji reformira kornjače podataka kao rečenice. Naša procjena, provedena na 17 podataka, pokazuje da FeSTE može stvoriti visoke kvalitetne funkcije i značajno nadmašiti postojeće rješenja za finaliziranje.', 'da': 'Berigelsen af tabeldatasæt ved hjælp af eksterne kilder har fået stor opmærksomhed i de senere år. Eksisterende løsninger ignorerer dog enten eksterne ustrukturerede data fuldstændigt eller udtænker datasætsspecifikke løsninger. I dette studie foreslog vi Few-Shot Transformer Based Enrichment (FeSTE), en generisk og robust ramme for berigelse af tabeldatasæt ved hjælp af ustrukturerede data. Ved at træne over flere datasæt er vores tilgang i stand til at udvikle generiske modeller, der kan anvendes på yderligere datasæt med minimal træning (dvs. få skud). Vores tilgang er baseret på en tilpasning af BERT, hvor vi præsenterer en ny finjusterende tilgang, der omformulerer tuplerne i datasættet som sætninger. Vores evaluering, der er udført på 17 datasæt, viser, at FeSTE er i stand til at generere funktioner af høj kvalitet og betydeligt overgå eksisterende finjusterende løsninger.', 'nl': 'De verrijking van tabelvormige datasets met behulp van externe bronnen heeft de afgelopen jaren veel aandacht gekregen. Bestaande oplossingen negeren echter externe ongestructureerde gegevens volledig of bedenken datasetspecifieke oplossingen. In deze studie hebben we Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE) voorgesteld, een generiek en robuust raamwerk voor de verrijking van tabelvormige datasets met behulp van ongestructureerde data. Door te trainen over meerdere datasets, is onze aanpak in staat om generieke modellen te ontwikkelen die kunnen worden toegepast op aanvullende datasets met minimale training (d.w.z. few-shot). Onze aanpak is gebaseerd op een aanpassing van BERT, waarvoor we een nieuwe fine-tuning aanpak presenteren die de tupels van de datasets herformuleert als zinnen. Onze evaluatie, uitgevoerd op 17-datasets, toont aan dat FeSTE in staat is hoogwaardige functies te genereren en bestaande fine-tuning oplossingen aanzienlijk te overtreffen.', 'de': 'Die Anreicherung von tabellarischen Datensätzen mit externen Quellen hat in den letzten Jahren große Aufmerksamkeit gewonnen. Bestehende Lösungen ignorieren jedoch entweder externe unstrukturierte Daten vollständig oder entwickeln datensatzspezifische Lösungen. In dieser Studie haben wir Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE) vorgeschlagen, ein generisches und robustes Framework zur Anreicherung von tabellarischen Datensätzen mit unstrukturierten Daten. Durch Training über mehrere Datensätze ist unser Ansatz in der Lage, generische Modelle zu entwickeln, die auf zusätzliche Datensätze mit minimalem Training angewendet werden können (d.h. wenige Aufnahmen). Unser Ansatz basiert auf einer Adaption von BERT, für die wir einen neuartigen Feinabstimmungsansatz vorstellen, der die Tupel der Datensätze als Sätze umformuliert. Unsere Auswertung auf 17-Datensätzen zeigt, dass FeSTE in der Lage ist, qualitativ hochwertige Features zu generieren und bestehende Feinabstimmungslösungen deutlich zu übertreffen.', 'id': 'Pengkaya dataset tabular menggunakan sumber luar telah mendapatkan perhatian yang signifikan dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Solusi yang ada, bagaimanapun, sama ada mengabaikan data luar yang tidak terstrukturasi sepenuhnya atau merencanakan solusi spesifik dataset. Dalam studi ini kami mengusulkan Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE), sebuah rangkaian yang generik dan kuat untuk memperkaya dataset tabular menggunakan data yang tidak terstrukturasi. Dengan latihan melalui beberapa set data, pendekatan kita mampu mengembangkan model generik yang dapat diaplikasikan pada set data tambahan dengan latihan minimal (i.e., beberapa tembakan). pendekatan kita berdasarkan adaptasi dari BERT, untuk yang kita persembahkan pendekatan penyesuaian baru yang mengubah dua kali lipat dataset sebagai kalimat. Evaluasi kami, dilakukan pada 17 set data, menunjukkan bahwa FeSTE mampu menghasilkan fitur kualitas tinggi dan meningkatkan jauh lebih dari solusi penyesuaian yang ada.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 외부 데이터 원본을 이용하여 풍부한 표 데이터 집합은 이미 광범위한 관심을 불러일으켰다.그러나 기존의 해결 방안은 외부의 비구조화된 데이터를 완전히 무시하거나 데이터 집합에 특정한 해결 방안을 설계한다.이 연구에서 우리는 소량의 스냅샷 변환기를 바탕으로 하는 확장(FesTE)을 제시했다. 이것은 통용되고 건장한 구조로 비구조화된 데이터로 표 데이터 집합을 풍부하게 하는 데 사용된다.여러 개의 데이터 집합에 대한 훈련을 통해 우리의 방법은 유니버설 모델을 개발할 수 있다. 이런 모델은 추가 데이터 집합에 응용할 수 있고 최소한의 훈련(즉 아주 적은 렌즈)만 할 수 있다.우리의 방법은 BERT의 개편을 바탕으로 데이터 집합의 원조를 문장으로 다시 포맷하는 새로운 마이크로스피커 방법을 제시했다.17개 데이터 세트에서 실시한 평가에 따르면 FESTE는 고품질의 기능을 생성할 수 있으며 기존의 마이크로스피커 솔루션보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'fa': 'افزایش مجموعه\u200cهای اطلاعات تابلوری با استفاده از منابع خارجی در سال\u200cهای اخیر توجه بسیار زیادی به دست آورده است. ولی راه حل\u200cهای موجود، یا داده\u200cهای خارجی که ساخته نشده\u200cاند کاملاً نادیده بگیرید یا راه\u200cحل\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای برای مجموعه داده\u200cها را تغییر دهید. در این مطالعه ما پیشنهاد دادیم که تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی تغییر\u200cدهنده\u200cی کم شلیک بر اساس تغییر\u200cدهنده (FeSTE) یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار با تمرین روی مجموعه\u200cهای اطلاعات متعدد، دستور ما قادر است برای توسعه مدل\u200cهای ژنرالی که می\u200cتوانند به مجموعه\u200cهای اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای با تمرین minimal (یعنی چند شلیک) استفاده کنند. دستور ما بر اساس تعادل BERT است که برای آن یک دستور نیکوترین تنظیمات نویسی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که پارچه\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را به عنوان جمله\u200cها تغییر می\u200cدهد. ارزیابی ما، که روی 17 مجموعه داده\u200cها انجام شده، نشان می\u200cدهد که FeSTE قادر است ویژه\u200cهای کیفیت بالا تولید کند و به شدت بیشتر از راه حل\u200cهای خوب تنظیم موجود باشد.', 'sw': 'Kutajirishwa kwa taarifa za tabia kwa kutumia vyanzo vya nje vimekuwa na hisia kubwa katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Hata hivyo, suluhisho linalopo, au upuuze taarifa za nje ambazo hazijengwa kabisa au kutengeneza suluhisho maalum za taarifa. In this study we proposed Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE), a generic and robust framework for the enrichment of tabular datasets using unstructured data.  Kwa mafunzo zaidi ya seti za taarifa mbalimbali, mbinu yetu inaweza kuendeleza mifano ya kawaida ambayo inaweza kutumika kwenye seti za taarifa za ziada kwa mafunzo madogo (yaani, picha chache). Hatua yetu inatokana na mabadiliko ya BERT, ambayo tunaweka mbinu nzuri ya usambazaji wa riwaya inayobadili vifaa vya taarifa kama sentensi. Utafiti wetu, uliofanywa katika seti 17 za takwimu, unaonyesha kwamba FeSTE anaweza kutengeneza sifa kubwa za ubora na kwa kiasi kikubwa kutekeleza suluhisho lililopo.', 'tr': "Daşarydaky çeşmeler ullanýan täblisaň datum setirleriniň baglanmasy soňky ýyllarda has gowy üns aldy. Ýöne bar çözümler, ya daşarydaky düzümlenmeden maglumatlary tamamlandyr ýada harplary takyk çözümleri üýtget. Bu aramda biz FeSTE tabanly Küç Shot Transformer Gymmatylmagy (FeSTE), struktursyz maglumatlary ulanyp täblisaň we güýçli framlary teklip etdik. Birnäçe veri setirlerini ukyp bilen, biziň metodamyz i ň azyndan okuw bilen eklenen seretsel modelleri geliştirebilir. Biziň ýaryşymyz BERT adaptasiýasyna daýan ýar, bu sebäpde we munuň üçin data setirleriniň tupunlaryny sözlem diýip reform eden romanlaryň gowy düzeltmegi ýaryşyny görkeýäris. Biziň çykyşymyz, 17 datasetlerde gedilýär, FeSTE'iň ýokary kaliwatly çözümlerini döredip biljekdigini görkezýär we munyň bar iň täze çözümlerini çözebilir.", 'af': "Die verrykking van tabulêre datastelle wat eksterne bronne gebruik het, het in onlangse jaar betaling aandag gekry. Bestaande oplossings, egter, of ignoreer eksterne ongestruktureerde data volledig of stel datastel spesifieke oplossings. In hierdie studie het ons voorgestel 'n algemene en sterk raamwerk vir die verryking van tabulêre datastelle met gebruik van onstruktureerde data. Deur onderwerp oor veelvuldige datastelle, kan ons toegang generieke modele ontwikkel wat aan addisionele datastelle met minimaal onderwerp kan word (bv. paar-skoot). Ons toegang is gebaseer op 'n aanpassing van BERT, waarvan ons 'n novele fin-tuning toegang voorsien wat die tuples van die datastelle as setings reformeer. Ons evaluering, wat op 17 datastelle gedoen is, vertoon dat FeSTE in staat kan genereer hoë kwaliteit funksies en betekenlik uitvoer bestaande fine-tuning oplossings.", 'sq': 'Përpasuria e të dhënave tabulare që përdorin burime të jashtme ka fituar vëmendje të rëndësishme në vitet e fundit. Zgjidhjet ekzistuese, megjithatë, ose injorojnë plotësisht të dhënat e jashtme të papërstrukturuara ose hartojnë zgjidhje specifike të dataset. Në këtë studim propozuam pasurinë me bazë në Few-Shot Transformer (FeSTE), një kuadër gjenerik dhe të fortë për pasurinë e të dhënave tabulare duke përdorur të dhëna të paistrukturuara. Duke stërvitur mbi grupe të shumta të dhënash, qasja jonë është në gjendje të zhvillojë modele gjenerale që mund të aplikohen në grupe të dhënash shtesë me stërvitje minimal e (pra, pak fotografi). Përqasja jonë është bazuar në një përshtatje të BERT, për të cilën ne paraqesim një përshtatje të re të përshtatshme që reformulon dyfishat e të dhënave si fjalë. Vlerësimi ynë, kryer në 17 grupe të dhënash, tregon se FeSTE është në gjendje të gjenerojë karakteristika të cilësisë së lartë dhe të kalojë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme zgjidhjet ekzistuese të rregullimit.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ዓመታት ውስጥ የውጭ ኩነቶች በመጠቀም የአባቢው የዳታ ማሰሪያ ጥቅረት አግኝቷል፡፡ የአሁኑ መፍትሄዎች ግን የውጭው የተመሠረቱትን ዳታ ሙሉ ትተዋል ወይም የዳታ-set-specific መፍትሄዎችን መግለጫ አድርጉ፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የተመሳሳይ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የጠቅላላ እና የረኀብ ፍሬማርቶችን ለመጠቀም አግኝተናል፡፡ በብዙ ዳታተሮች ላይ በማስተማርነት፣ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ ሞዴል ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ አካሄዳችን የዳታ አካባቢዎችን እንደ ፍርድ የሚያደርግ የዘላለም አካሄድ አቀማመጥ ነው፡፡ የ17 ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ውስጥ የተደረገውን ማስታወቂያውን ፍSTE የጥልቅ ጥሩ ምርጫዎችን ማውጣት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում ուշադրություն դարձրել է արտաքին աղբյուրներից օգտագործվող աղբյուրներից օգտագործվող աղբյուրների հարստացմանը: Գոյություն ունեցող լուծումները, այնուամենայնիվ, կամ ամբողջովին անտեսեք արտաքին անկառուցվածքային տվյալները, կամ որոշեք տվյալների համակարգի մասնավոր լուծումներ: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք առաջարկեցինք Few-shot Transforme հիմնված հարստացում (FeSte), ընդհանուր և ուժեղ շրջանակ աղյուսակների տվյալների համակարգերի հարստացում օգտագործելով անկառուցվածքային տվյալներ: Մեր մոտեցումը կարող է զարգացնել ընդհանուր մոդելներ, որոնք կարող են կիրառվել ավելացված տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, որոնց միջոցով միմինալ վարժեցում է (այսինքն՝ քիչ լուսանկարներ): Մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է BER-ի ադապտացիայի վրա, որի համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր բարձրացող մոտեցում, որը վերաձևավորում է տվյալների համակարգերի երկու անգամ որպես նախադասություններ: Մեր գնահատումը, կատարված 17 տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, ցույց է տալիս, որ FeSte-ը կարողանում է ստեղծել բարձր որակային հատկություններ և նշանակալի գերազանցել գոյություն ունեցող բարձրակարգավորման լուծումն', 'bn': 'The enrichment of tabular datasets using external sources has gained significant attention in recent years.  তবে বিদ্যমান সমাধান, বাইরের অকার্যকর তথ্য পুরোপুরি উপেক্ষা করে অথবা ডাটাসেট-নির্দিষ্ট সমাধান তৈরি করুন। এই গবেষণায় আমরা অক্ষরিত তথ্য ব্যবহার করে ট্যাবুলাল ডাটাসেট সমৃদ্ধ করার জন্য একটি সাধারণ এবং রোবট কাঠামো প্রস্তাব করেছি। বেশ কয়েকটি ডাটাসেটের বেশী প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ সাধারণ মডেল উন্নয়ন করতে পারে যেগুলো কম প্রশিক্ষণের সাথে অতিরিক্ত তথ আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা বিবেরেটের একটি আপেটপেশনের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে, যার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস সুন্দর প্রতিযোগিতা উপস্থাপন করি যা ডাটাসেটে আমাদের মূল্য, ১৭ তথ্য সেটে অনুষ্ঠিত হয়েছে, দেখাচ্ছে যে ফেস্টি উচ্চ মানের বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করতে সক্ষম এবং বিদ্যমান সুন্দর সুযোগের', 'az': "Dərzində mənbələr istifadə edərək tabular veri qurularının genişlənməsi son illərdə möhkəm məlumatları artırdı. Ancaq mövcud çətinləri ya daxilində qurulmadığı məlumatları tamamilə görməyin, ya da verilən quruluş müəyyən çətinləri təyin et. Bu təhsil içində biz FeSTE tabanlı Küçük-Shot Transformer Enrichment (FeSTE) təklif etdik, qurulmadığımız məlumatları istifadə edərək tabular veri qurğularının genişlənməsi üçün çox qüvvətli və qüvvətli frameworklər təklif etdik. Birçox verilən qurğular üzərində təhsil etmək vasitəsilə, bizim metodumuz minimal təhsil ilə istifadə edilə biləcək çoxlu verilən modellərə təhsil edə bilər. Bizim yaxınlığımız BERT'nin uyğunlaşdırmasına dayandırılmışdır. Biz onun üçün yeni təmizləmə yaxınlığını göstəririk ki, verilən quruluşlarını cümlələr kimi dəyişdirir. 17 verilən qurğularda işlədiyimiz değerlendirmək FeSTE yüksək kaliteli xüsusiyyətləri yarada bilər və mövcud mövcud təmizləyici çətinliklərdən çox üstün olar.", 'cs': 'Obohacení tabulkových datových souborů pomocí externích zdrojů získalo v posledních letech významnou pozornost. Stávající řešení však buď úplně ignorují externí nestrukturovaná data, nebo navrhují řešení specifická pro datovou sadu. V této studii jsme navrhli Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE), obecný a robustní rámec pro obohacení tabulkových datových sad pomocí nestrukturovaných dat. Školením na více datových sadách je náš přístup schopen vytvořit generické modely, které lze aplikovat na další datové sady s minimálním tréninkem (tj. málo záběrů). Náš přístup je založen na adaptaci BERT, pro kterou představujeme nový přístup k jemnému ladění, který přeformuluje vlnky datových sad jako věty. Naše hodnocení provedené na sedmnácti datových sadách ukazuje, že FeSTE je schopen generovat vysoce kvalitní funkce a výrazně překonat stávající řešení jemného ladění.', 'ca': "L'enriqueciment de conjunts de dades tabulars que utilitzen fonts externes ha guanyat una atenció significativa en els últims anys. Però les solucions existents, o ignoren totalment les dades externes no estructuradas, o dissenyen solucions específices del conjunt de dades. En aquest estudi vam proposar un enriqueciment basat en Few-Shot Transformer (FeSTE), un marc genèric i robust per enriquecer conjunts de dades tabulars utilitzant dades no estructuradas. Treinant sobre múltiples conjunts de dades, el nostre enfocament és capaç de desenvolupar models genèrics que es poden aplicar a conjunts de dades adicionals amb una capacitat mínima (és a dir, pocs fotos). El nostre enfocament està basat en una adaptació del BERT, per la qual presentem un enfocament novel d'ajustament que reformula els dobles dels conjunts de dades com a frases. La nostra avaluació, feta amb 17 conjunts de dades, mostra que FeSTE és capaç de generar característiques d'alta qualitat i superar significativament les solucions d'ajustament existents.", 'bs': 'Obogaćanje tabularnih seta podataka koristeći vanjske izvore dobilo je značajnu pažnju u posljednjih godina. Međutim, postojeće rješenja ili ignorirati spoljne ne strukture podatke u potpunosti ili smisliti specifične rješenja podataka. U ovom ispitivanju smo predložili objašnjenje na osnovu "FeSTE", generični i snažni okvir za bogatstvo tabularnih seta podataka koristeći neostrukturne podatke. Obučavajući više podataka, naš pristup je u stanju razviti generične modele koje se mogu primjenjivati na dodatne podatake sa minimalnim obukom (t.i., malo snimanja). Naš pristup je baziran na adaptaciji BERT-a, za koju predstavljamo novi pristup ispravnoj prilagodbi koji reformira poklopce podataka kao rečenice. Naša procjena, provedena na 17 podataka, pokazuje da FeSTE može stvoriti visoke kvalitetne funkcije i značajno nadmašiti postojeće rješenje za finaliziranje.', 'fi': 'Taulukkotietojen rikastaminen ulkoisten lähteiden avulla on saanut viime vuosina merkittävää huomiota. Olemassa olevat ratkaisut kuitenkin joko sivuuttavat ulkoisen rakenteettoman datan kokonaan tai kehittävät aineistokohtaisia ratkaisuja. Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotimme Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE), geneeristä ja vankkaa kehystä taulukkoaineistojen rikastamiseen strukturoimattomalla datalla. Kouluttamalla useita datakokonaisuuksia lähestymistapamme pystyy kehittämään geneerisiä malleja, joita voidaan soveltaa ylimääräisiin datakokonaisuuksiin minimaalisella harjoittelulla (eli muutamalla laukauksella). Lähestymistapamme perustuu BERT:n mukautukseen, johon esittelemme uudenlaisen hienosäätömenetelmän, joka muotoilee aineistojen tuplat lauseiksi. 17 aineistosta tehty arviointi osoittaa, että FeSTE pystyy tuottamaan laadukkaita ominaisuuksia ja ylittämään merkittävästi olemassa olevat hienosäätöratkaisut.', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on märkimisväärset tähelepanu pälvinud tabeliandmekogumite rikastamine välisallikate abil. Olemasolevad lahendused kas ignoreerivad täielikult väliseid struktureerimata andmeid või töötavad välja andmekogumile spetsiifilised lahendused. Selles uuringus pakkusime välja FeSTE (FeSTE-Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment), üldise ja tugeva raamistiku tabeliandmekogumite rikastamiseks struktureerimata andmete abil. Koolitades mitme andmekogumi, on meie lähenemisviis võimeline välja töötama üldised mudelid, mida saab rakendada täiendavatele andmekogumitele minimaalse koolitusega (st vähese võimalusega). Meie lähenemisviis põhineb BERT-i kohandamisel, mille jaoks esitame uudset peenhäälestuslikku lähenemisviisi, mis vormistab andmekogumite tuplid lausetena. Meie 17 andmekogumi põhjal läbi viidud hindamine näitab, et FeSTE suudab luua kvaliteetseid funktsioone ja oluliselt ületada olemasolevaid peenhäälestuslahendusi.', 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih je pridobila veliko pozornosti obogatitev tabelarnih zbirk podatkov z uporabo zunanjih virov. Vendar obstoječe rešitve bodisi popolnoma ignorirajo zunanje nestrukturirane podatke ali pa oblikujejo rešitve, specifične za nabor podatkov. V tej študiji smo predlagali FeSTE (FeSTE), generičen in robusten okvir za obogatitev tabularnih naborov podatkov z nestrukturiranimi podatki. Z usposabljanjem na več naborih podatkov lahko naš pristop razvije generične modele, ki jih je mogoče uporabiti za dodatne nabore podatkov z minimalnim usposabljanjem (tj. malo strela). Naš pristop temelji na prilagoditvi BERT-a, za katero predstavljamo nov pristop fine-tuning, ki preoblikuje tuple naborov podatkov v stavke. Naša ocena, opravljena na 17 naborih podatkov, kaže, da je FeSTE sposoben ustvariti visokokakovostne funkcije in znatno preseči obstoječe rešitve finega nastavitve.', 'ha': "Kujirin danna na tabular data set uses sources na ƙarƙashin, sun nuna muhimmin aikin muhimmi cikin shekara na farko. Babu zama masu shiryuwa da amfani da shi, ko kuma ka ƙẽtare data masu gaban da ba'a tsare shi ba, ko kuma ka ƙayyade masu daidaita masu ƙayyade danne. A cikin wannan littafin nan, muka buɗa'ar da aka ƙayyade Enrichnent (FestuS), wani firam na dama da aka buɗe wa rikitar da data na tabulum da ba'a tsare shi ba. Ga amfani da yin amfani da kowace tsaro masu yawa, hanyoyinmu na iya buɗe misãlai masu motsi na dabam-daban, wanda za'a iya amfani da su ga tsarin data masu ƙarami (misali, masu basu-shot). Mataimakinmu ne a kan adadin BERT, don haka kuma munã gabatar da wata hanyarwa mai kyau wanda ke gyara taskõkin mutane kamar maganar. Anarari kanmu, da aka samar a kan 17 database, yana nũna cewa FestuS na iya iya iya ƙiƙiro wasu sifati masu nau'i da kuma yana mai ƙayyade fassarar masu shiryuwa masu ciki.", 'jv': 'text-editor-action Where am I Nang barêng-barêng iki kamu ngéwangi "Few-shot Transformer" sing basa Gambar, dadi generic lan akèh dumadhi kanggo nggawe dataset Tabular Nejer Ndheke dhéwé wis basa sak adalah BERT, iki dadi awak dhéwé ngewehku botem sing beraksi dadi nggawe ngubah dhéwé dadi kebebasané perusahaan dataset nganggo dolanan sing beraksi. Isopo sing dipunangé, ditambahak ing 18 dataset, menehi ngomong nik FeSTAE iso nggawe akeh perusahaan sing katya luwih dumadhi lan akeh iso nggawe barang langgar sampeyan winih', 'he': 'העשירות של קבוצות מידע שולחנות בשימוש במקורים חיצוניים קיבלה תשומת לב משמעותית בשנים האחרונות. לפתרונות קיימות, בכל אופן, או להתעלם מידע חיצוני לא מבושל לחלוטין או לתכנן פתרונות מסויימים לקבוצת מידע. במחקר הזה הצענו עשירה מבוססת מעט תמונות (FeSTE), סגרת גנרלית וחזקה למעשירה של קבוצות נתונים טבלוניות בשימוש נתונים לא מבושלים. By training over multiple datasets, our approach is able to develop generic models that can be applied to additional datasets with minimal training (i.e., few-shot).  הגישה שלנו מבוססת על התאמה של BERT, עבור מה שאנחנו מציגים גישה חדשה מתאימה שמפורסמת מחדש את כפול של קבוצת המידע כמשפטים. Our evaluation, conducted on 17 datasets, shows that FeSTE is able to generate high quality features and significantly outperform existing fine-tuning solutions.', 'bo': 'ཕྱིར་ཐོན་ཁུངས་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག Existing solutions, however, either ignore external unstructured data completely or devise dataset-specific solutions. In this study we proposed Few-Shot Transformer based Enrichment (FeSTE), a generic and robust framework for the enrichment of tabular datasets using unstructured data. Name ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བདེ་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་མཐུད་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནི་BERT ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཞི་བྱས་ཡོད། དེ་ལ་ང་ཚོས་གསར་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཉེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ ང་ཚོའི་དཔྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་ཚན་17 ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་བཞིན་བྱས་ཡོད་པས། FeSTE ནི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་'}
{'en': 'ParaDetox Detoxification with Parallel Data', 'ar': 'Summ $ ^ N $: إطار عمل تلخيص متعدد المراحل لمستندات وحوارات الإدخال الطويلة', 'es': 'Summ$^N$: Un marco de resumen de varias etapas para diálogos y documentos de entrada largos', 'fr': 'Summ$^N$\xa0: Un cadre de synthèse en plusieurs étapes pour les dialogues et les documents de saisie longue', 'pt': 'Summ$^N$: Uma estrutura de sumarização de vários estágios para diálogos e documentos de entrada longa', 'ja': 'SUM $^ N $：長い入力ダイアログと文書のための多段階の要約フレームワーク', 'hi': 'Summ$^N$: लंबे इनपुट संवाद और दस्तावेज़ों के लिए एक बहु-चरण सारांशीकरण फ्रेमवर्क', 'zh': 'Summ$^N$:长文档多摘要框架', 'ru': 'Резюме$ ^N$: Рамки многоэтапного обобщения для длительных диалогов и документов', 'ga': 'Summ$^N$: Creat Achoimre Ilchéime le haghaidh Idirphlé Ionchuir Fhada agus Doiciméid', 'hu': 'Summ$^N$: Többszakaszos összefoglaló keretrendszer hosszú beviteli párbeszédekhez és dokumentumokhoz', 'ka': 'Summ$^N$: დიალოდ შეტყობინებული დიალოგიების და დოკუმენტების მრავალური კომპანიზაციის კომპანიზაცია', 'el': 'Σύνοψη$^Ν$: Ένα πολυεπίπεδο πλαίσιο συνοψίας για διαλόγους και έγγραφα μακράς εισαγωγής', 'it': 'Summ$^N$: un quadro di riepilogo multi-fase per dialoghi e documenti di input lunghi', 'lt': 'Santrauka$^N$: Daugiaetapė ilgų įvedimų dialogų ir dokumentų santraukų sistema', 'mk': 'Сум$^N$: Мултифазиска рамка за резултати за долги внесувачки дијалози и документи', 'kk': 'Тұжырымдама$^N$: Уақыт келтіру диалогтар мен құжаттар үшін көптеген тұжырымдама фреймі', 'ms': 'Ringkasan$^N$: Sebuah Ruang Ringkasan Bertahap untuk Dialog Input Panjang dan Dokumen', 'mt': "Sommarju$^N$: Qafas ta' Sommarju Multi-Stadji għal Djalogi u Dokumenti ta' Input Tul", 'ml': 'Summ$^N$: A Multi-Stage Summarization Framework for Long Input Dialogues and Documents', 'mn': 'Summ$^N$: Урт ирээдүйн диалогууд болон баримтуудын олон түвшин дээрэмжлэх хэлбэр', 'no': 'Sammendrag$^N$: Eit ramme for sammendraging av fleire stader for lange inndatadialogar og dokument', 'pl': 'Summ$^N$: Wielostopniowe ramy podsumowania dla długich dialogów wejściowych i dokumentów', 'ro': 'Summ$^N$: Un cadru de sintetizare în mai multe etape pentru dialoguri și documente de intrare lungi', 'sr': 'Summ$^N$: okvir za sažetanje višestrukih stadija za duge dijaloge i dokumente za ulazak', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ$^N$: ගොඩක් ස්ටේජ් සංවාදය සහ දත්ත', 'sv': 'Summ$^N$: En sammanfattningsram i flera steg för långa inmatningsdialoger och dokument', 'so': 'N$: A Multi-Stage Summarization Framework for Long Input Dialogs and Documents', 'ta': 'சுருக்கம் $^N$: நீண்ட உள்ளீடு உரையாடல் மற்றும் ஆவணங்களுக்கான ஒரு பல- அடுக்கு சுருக்கமாக்கும் சட்டம்', 'ur': 'Summ$^N$: Long Input Dialogs and Documents کے لئے ایک Multi Stage Summarization Framework', 'uz': 'Yangi xat keldiComment', 'vi': 'Chương trình tổng kết đa giai đoạn cho ca thoại nhập dài và tài liệu.', 'bg': 'Обобщение$^N$: Многоетапна рамка за обобщаване за дълги диалози и документи за въвеждане', 'da': 'Summ$^N$: En sammenfattende ramme for lange input dialoger og dokumenter', 'nl': 'Summ$^N$: Een multi-stage summarization framework voor lange invoerdialogen en documenten', 'hr': 'Summ$^N$: okvir skupljanja višestrukih stupnjeva za duge dijaloge i dokumente za ulaz', 'id': 'Ringkasan$^N$: Sebuah Ruang Ringkasan Multi-Stage untuk Dialog Input Panjang dan Dokumen', 'de': 'Summ$^N$: Ein mehrstufiges Summarisationsrahmen für lange Eingabedialoge und Dokumente', 'ko': 'Summ$^N$: 대화와 문서를 길게 입력할 수 있는 다단계 요약 프레임워크', 'fa': 'Summ$^N$: یک چشمه جمع\u200cسازی چند مرحله برای محاورۀ ورودهای طولانی و سند', 'sw': 'Mkutano $^N$: Mpango wa Ujumbe wa Ujumbe wa Ujumbe wa Ujumbe wa Zaidi kwa ajili ya Dialogu na Waraka', 'tr': 'Hula첵at챌y$^N$: Uzun girdi dialoglar we Senedler 체챌in bir n채챌e-staj Topla첵y힊 Framesi', 'af': "Opsomming$^N$: ' n Multi- Stapel Opsomming Raamwerk vir Lang Invoer Dialoog en Dokumente", 'sq': 'Summ$^N$: A Multi-Stage Summarization Framework for Long Input Dialogues and Documents', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Տարբեր աստիճանների համառոտագրման շրջանակ երկար մուտքային պատկերների և փաստաթղթերի համար', 'az': 'Summ$^N$: Uzun girdi dialogları və Belgələri üçün çoxlu-Staj Toplaşdırma Framework', 'bn': 'দীর্ঘ ইনপুট ডায়ালগ এবং ডকুমেন্ট', 'bs': 'Summ$^N$: Multi-Stage Summarization Framework for Long Input Dialogs and Documents', 'cs': 'Summ$^N$: Vícestupňový souhrnný rámec pro dlouhé vstupní dialogy a dokumenty', 'ca': 'Resum$^N$: Un marc multietapa de resum dels diÃ\xa0legs i documentos de llarga entrada', 'fi': 'Summ$^N$: Monivaiheinen yhteenvetokehys pitkille syöttökeskusteluille ja asiakirjoille', 'et': 'Summ$^N$: pikkade sisendidialoogide ja dokumentide mitmeastmeline kokkuvõtlusraamistik', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'sk': 'Summ$^N$: Večstopenjski okvir za povzetek za dolge vnosne pogovore in dokumente', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Summ$^N$: A Multi-Stage Summarization Framework for Long Input Dialogues and Documents', 'bo': 'Summ$^N$: 嘟撪絼嗉嬥綘嘟囙酱嘟傕紜嘟︵緬嗑侧郊嘟樴紜嘟戉絼嗉嬥健嘟侧絺嗉嬥絾嗉嬥舰嗑┼讲嘟︵紜嘟愢郊嘟傕紜嘟樴經嘟监綉嗉嬥絹嗑侧綐嗉嬥綎嗑编胶嘟戉紜嘟︵緪嘟栢溅嗉嬥絸嗑编讲嗉嬥綎嘟︵尽嘟脆溅嗉嬥舰嘟侧綐'}
{'en': 'We present a novel pipeline for the collection of parallel data for the detoxification task We collect non toxic paraphrases for over 10,000 English toxic sentences We also show that this pipeline can be used to distill a large existing corpus of paraphrases to get toxic neutral sentence pairs We release two parallel corpora which can be used for the training of detoxification models To the best of our knowledge these are the first parallel datasets for this task We describe our pipeline in detail to make it fast to set up for a new language or domain thus contributing to faster and easier development of new parallel resources We train several detoxification models on the collected data and compare them with several baselines and state of the art unsupervised approaches We conduct both automatic and manual evaluations All models trained on parallel data outperform the state of the art unsupervised models by a large margin This suggests that our novel datasets can boost the performance of detoxification systems', 'ar': 'يساعد تلخيص النص القراء على الحصول على معلومات بارزة من الوثائق والأخبار والمقابلات والاجتماعات. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم نماذج اللغات المتقدمة (LM) غير قادرة على معالجة النصوص الطويلة بكفاءة للعديد من مهام التلخيص. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح Summ $ ^ N $ ، وهو إطار عمل متعدد المراحل بسيط ومرن وفعال للنصوص المدخلة التي تكون أطول من الحد الأقصى لطول السياق للنماذج LM النموذجية سابقة التدريب. يقوم Summ $ ^ N $ أولاً بتقسيم عينات البيانات وإنشاء ملخص تقريبي على مراحل متعددة ثم ينتج الملخص النهائي الدقيق بناءً عليه. يمكن لإطار عملنا معالجة نص الإدخال ذي الطول التعسفي عن طريق ضبط عدد المراحل مع الحفاظ على حجم إدخال LM ثابتًا. علاوة على ذلك ، يمكنه التعامل مع كل من المستندات والحوارات أحادية المصدر ، ويمكن استخدامه فوق نماذج تلخيص تجريدية أساسية مختلفة. على حد علمنا ، Summ $ ^ N $ هو أول إطار متعدد المراحل منقسمة ثم تلخيص لتلخيص المدخلات الطويلة. تُظهر تجاربنا أن Summ $ ^ N $ يتفوق في الأداء على أحدث الأساليب السابقة من خلال تحسين نتائج ROUGE في ثلاث مجموعات بيانات تلخيص اجتماعات طويلة AMI و ICSI و QMSum ، وهما مجموعتي بيانات مسلسلات تلفزيونية طويلة من SummScreen ومجموعة بيانات تلخيص وثيقة طويلة تقرير حكومي. تتوفر بياناتنا وكودنا على https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'es': 'El resumen de texto ayuda a los lectores a capturar información destacada de documentos, noticias, entrevistas y reuniones. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los modelos lingüísticos (LM) preentrenados de última generación no pueden procesar de manera eficiente textos largos para muchas tareas de resumen. En este artículo, proponemos Summ$^N$, un marco de varias etapas simple, flexible y efectivo para textos de entrada que son más largos que la longitud máxima de contexto de los LM preentrenados típicos. Summ$^N$ primero divide las muestras de datos y genera un resumen aproximado en varias etapas y, a continuación, produce el resumen final detallado basado en él. Nuestro marco puede procesar texto de entrada de longitud arbitraria ajustando el número de etapas mientras se mantiene fijo el tamaño de entrada LM. Además, puede tratar tanto con documentos de una sola fuente como con diálogos, y se puede utilizar sobre diferentes modelos de resumen abstractivo de red troncal. Hasta donde sabemos, Summ$^N$ es el primer marco de varias etapas para dividir y luego resumir para resumir entradas largas. Nuestros experimentos demuestran que Sum$^N$ supera a los métodos de vanguardia anteriores al mejorar las puntuaciones ROUGE en tres conjuntos de datos de resumen de reuniones largas AMI, ICSI y QMSum, dos conjuntos de datos de series de televisión largas de SummScreen y un conjunto de datos de resumen de documentos largos GovReport. Nuestros datos y código están disponibles en https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'fr': "La synthèse textuelle aide les lecteurs à saisir des informations importantes à partir de documents, d'actualités, d'entretiens et de réunions. Cependant, la plupart des modèles de langage préentraînés (LM) de pointe ne sont pas en mesure de traiter efficacement de longs textes pour de nombreuses tâches de synthèse. Dans cet article, nous proposons Summ$^N$, un cadre multi-étapes simple, flexible et efficace pour les textes d'entrée qui sont plus longs que la longueur de contexte maximale des LM préentraînés typiques. Summ$^N$ divise d'abord les échantillons de données et génère un résumé grossier en plusieurs étapes, puis produit le résumé fin final basé sur celui-ci. Notre framework peut traiter un texte d'entrée de longueur arbitraire en ajustant le nombre d'étapes tout en conservant la taille d'entrée LM fixe. De plus, il peut traiter à la fois des documents source unique et des dialogues, et il peut être utilisé sur différents modèles de synthèse abstraite backbone. À notre connaissance, Summ$^N$ est le premier framework multi-étapes fractionné puis résumé pour la synthèse des entrées longues. Nos expériences démontrent que Summ$^N$ surpasse les méthodes de pointe précédentes en améliorant les scores ROUGE sur trois ensembles de données de synthèse de longues réunions AMI, ICSI et QMSum, deux ensembles de données de séries télévisées longues de SummScreen et un ensemble de données de synthèse de documents longs GovReport. Nos données et notre code sont disponibles sur https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'pt': 'A sumarização de texto ajuda os leitores a capturar informações importantes de documentos, notícias, entrevistas e reuniões. No entanto, a maioria dos modelos de linguagem pré-treinados (LM) de última geração são incapazes de processar com eficiência textos longos para muitas tarefas de sumarização. Neste artigo, propomos Summ$^N$, uma estrutura de vários estágios simples, flexível e eficaz para textos de entrada que são maiores do que o comprimento máximo do contexto de LMs pré-treinados típicos. Summ$^N$ primeiro divide as amostras de dados e gera um resumo grosseiro em vários estágios e, em seguida, produz o resumo final granulado com base nele. Nossa estrutura pode processar texto de entrada de comprimento arbitrário ajustando o número de estágios enquanto mantém o tamanho de entrada LM fixo. Além disso, ele pode lidar com documentos e diálogos de fonte única e pode ser usado em cima de diferentes modelos de resumo abstrativos de backbone. Até onde sabemos, Summ$^N$ é a primeira estrutura de divisão e resumo em vários estágios para sumarização de entrada longa. Nossos experimentos demonstram que Summ$^N$ supera os métodos de última geração anteriores, melhorando as pontuações do ROUGE em três conjuntos de dados de sumarização de reuniões longas AMI, ICSI e QMSum, dois conjuntos de dados de séries de TV longos da SummScreen e um conjunto de dados de sumarização de documentos longos Relatório Gov. Nossos dados e código estão disponíveis em https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ja': 'テキストの要約は、ドキュメント、ニュース、インタビュー、ミーティングから顕著な情報を読み取るのに役立ちます。 しかし、ほとんどの最先端の事前訓練された言語モデル（ LM ）は、多くの要約タスクのために長いテキストを効率的に処理することができません。 この論文では、典型的な事前訓練されたLMの最大コンテキスト長よりも長い入力テキストのためのシンプルで柔軟で効果的な多段階フレームワークであるSum $ ^ N $を提案します。 SUM $^ N $は最初にデータサンプルを分割し、複数の段階で粗いサマリーを生成し、それに基づいて最終的な細かいサマリーを生成します。 当社のフレームワークは、LM入力サイズを固定したままステージ数を調整することにより、任意の長さの入力テキストを処理することができます。 さらに、シングルソースのドキュメントとダイアログの両方を扱うことができ、さまざまなバックボーン抽象的な要約モデルの上で使用することができます。 私たちの知る限りでは、Sum $^ N $は長い入力の要約のための最初の多段階分割された要約フレームワークです。 当社の実験は、3つの長い会議概要データセットAMI、ICSI、QMSum、2つの長いテレビシリーズデータセットSumScreen、および長い文書概要データセットGovReportのROUGEスコアを改善することにより、Sum $^ N $が従来の最先端の方法を上回ることを実証しています。 当社のデータとコードは、https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-Nで入手できます。', 'ru': 'Резюме текста помогает читателям получить важную информацию из документов, новостей, интервью и встреч. Тем не менее, большинство современных предварительно подготовленных языковых моделей (LM) не в состоянии эффективно обрабатывать длинный текст для многих задач обобщения. В этой статье мы предлагаем Summ$ ^N$, простую, гибкую и эффективную многоступенчатую структуру для входных текстов, которые длиннее, чем максимальная длина контекста типичных предварительно обученных LM. Сумма$ ^N$ сначала разбивает выборки данных и генерирует грубую сводку в несколько этапов, а затем создает окончательную мелкозернистую сводку на ее основе. Наш фреймворк может обрабатывать входной текст произвольной длины, регулируя количество этапов, сохраняя при этом фиксированный размер входного LM. Кроме того, он может иметь дело как с документами из одного источника, так и с диалогами, и его можно использовать поверх различных базовых абстрактных моделей обобщения. Насколько нам известно, Summ$ ^N$ - это первая многоступенчатая структура разделения, а затем суммирования для длительного обобщения вводимых данных. Наши эксперименты показывают, что Summ$ ^N$ превосходит предыдущие современные методы, улучшая баллы ROUGE по трем наборам данных AMI, ICSI и QMSum, двум наборам данных длинных сериалов из SummScreen и набору данных сводных документов GovReport. Наши данные и код доступны по адресу https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'zh': '文本摘要助读者得重信于文档、新闻、访谈、会议。 然多先进预训语 (LM) 不能多处摘要长文本。 本文之中,发Summ$^N$此一简,便宜多框架,输入文本,其长比典LM最大上下文长。 吾框架可以调阶段数以处长短之输文本,而持LM输大小定。 可以处单源文档与言,而抽象摘要形之上。 以吾所知,Summ$^N$ 首用于久输汇总者多拆分而总框架。 臣等实验明,Summ$^N$于三长会议摘要数集AMI,ICSI、QMSum,SummScreen两长电视系列数集及一长文档摘要数集GovReport上增ROUGE分数,以优前最先进之法。 吾数与代码可在 https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N。', 'hi': 'पाठ सारांश पाठकों को दस्तावेज़ों, समाचारों, साक्षात्कारों और बैठकों से मुख्य जानकारी कैप्चर करने में मदद करता है। हालांकि, अधिकांश अत्याधुनिक प्रीट्रेन्ड लैंग्वेज मॉडल (एलएम) कई सारांशीकरण कार्यों के लिए लंबे पाठ को कुशलतापूर्वक संसाधित करने में असमर्थ हैं। इस पेपर में, हम Summ$^N$, इनपुट ग्रंथों के लिए एक सरल, लचीला और प्रभावी बहु-चरणीय रूपरेखा प्रस्तावित करते हैं जो विशिष्ट पूर्वप्रशिक्षित LMs की अधिकतम संदर्भ लंबाई से अधिक लंबा होता है। Summ$^N$ पहले डेटा नमूनों को विभाजित करता है और कई चरणों में एक मोटा सारांश उत्पन्न करता है और फिर इसके आधार पर अंतिम ठीक-दाने वाला सारांश उत्पन्न करता है। हमारा ढांचा एलएम इनपुट आकार को तय रखते हुए चरणों की संख्या को समायोजित करके मनमाने ढंग से लंबाई के इनपुट पाठ को संसाधित कर सकता है। इसके अलावा, यह एकल-स्रोत दस्तावेजों और संवादों दोनों से निपट सकता है, और इसका उपयोग विभिन्न बैकबोन अमूर्त सारांशीकरण मॉडल के शीर्ष पर किया जा सकता है। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, Summ $^ N$ लंबे इनपुट सारांशीकरण के लिए पहला बहु-चरण विभाजन-तो-सारांशित रूपरेखा है। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि Summ $^N$ तीन लंबी बैठक summarization datasets AMI, ICSI, और QMSum, SummScreen से दो लंबी टीवी श्रृंखला डेटासेट, और एक लंबा दस्तावेज़ summarization डेटासेट GovReport पर रूज स्कोर में सुधार करके पिछले राज्य के अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। हमारा डेटा और कोड https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuidíonn achoimre téacs le léitheoirí faisnéis shuntasach a ghabháil ó dhoiciméid, nuacht, agallaimh agus cruinnithe. Mar sin féin, níl an chuid is mó de na samhlacha teanga réamhoilte (LM) úrscothach in ann téacs fada a phróiseáil go héifeachtach le haghaidh go leor tascanna achoimre. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid Summ$^N$, creat ilchéime simplí, solúbtha agus éifeachtach le haghaidh téacsanna ionchuir atá níos faide ná uasfhad comhthéacs na LManna réamhoilte tipiciúil. Roinneann Summ$^N$ na samplaí sonraí ar dtús agus gineann sé achoimre gharbh i gcéimeanna éagsúla agus ansin cuireann sé an achoimre mhínínithe deiridh ar fáil bunaithe air. Is féidir lenár gcreat téacs ionchuir de fhad treallach a phróiseáil trí líon na gcéimeanna a choigeartú agus méid an ionchuir LM a choinneáil seasta. Ina theannta sin, féadann sé déileáil le doiciméid aonfhoinse agus le hagallaimh araon, agus is féidir é a úsáid ar bharr samhlacha éagsúla achoimre teibí cnámh droma. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é Summ$^N$ an chéad chreat ilchéime scoilte-ansin-achoimriú le haghaidh achoimriú ionchuir fhada. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn Summ$^N$ modhanna úrscothacha roimhe seo trí scóir ROUGE ar thrí thacar sonraí achoimre cruinnithe fada AMI, ICSI, agus QMSum a fheabhsú, dhá thacar sonraí sraithe fada teilifíse ó SummScreen, agus tacar sonraí achoimre doiciméad fada Tuarascáil Gov. Tá ár sonraí agus ár gcód ar fáil ag https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'hu': 'A szövegösszefoglaló segítségével az olvasók fontos információkat szerezhetnek dokumentumokból, hírekből, interjúkból és találkozókból. A legtöbb korszerűbb előképzett nyelvi modell (LM) azonban nem képes hatékonyan feldolgozni a hosszú szöveget számos összefoglaló feladathoz. Ebben a tanulmányban a Summ$^N$-t javasoljuk, egy egyszerű, rugalmas és hatékony többlépcsős keretrendszert a tipikus előkészített LM-ek maximális kontextushosszánál hosszabb beviteli szövegekhez. A Summ$^N$ először felosztja az adatmintákat, és több szakaszban durva összefoglalót generál, majd ezen alapuló végső finomszemcsés összefoglalót készít. Keretrendszerünk tetszőleges hosszúságú bemeneti szöveget tud feldolgozni a lépések számának beállításával, miközben rögzítve tartja az LM bemeneti méretet. Ezenkívül egyforrású dokumentumokkal és párbeszédekkel is foglalkozik, és különböző gerinc absztraktív összefoglaló modellek mellett használható. Legjobb tudásunk szerint a Summ$^N$ az első többlépcsős osztott-majd-összefoglaló keretrendszer a hosszú bemeneti összefoglaláshoz. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a Summ$^N$ felülmúlja a korábbi legkorszerűbb módszereket azzal, hogy javítja a ROUGE pontszámokat három hosszú találkozó összefoglaló adatkészleten AMI, ICSI és QMSum, két hosszú tévésorozat adatkészleten SummScreen, valamint egy hosszú dokumentum összefoglaló adatkészleten GovReport. Adataink és kódjaink az alábbi címen érhetők el: https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის სიმბოლობა დახმარებს კითხველებს წარმოიდგინოთ წარმოიდგინული ინფორმაცია დოკუმენტებით, ახალი, ინტერუქტურების და შეხვედრებ მაგრამ უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენილი ენის მოდელები (LM) არ შეუძლებელია ეფექტიურად წარმოდგენა ძალიან სიგრძე ტექსტის გამოყენება ბევრი საუკუმეტურება. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მინდომა Summ$^N$, საუკეთესო, გრძნობელი, და ეფექტიური მრავალ სეტაციის კონტექსტის განმავლობაზე, რომელიც განმავლობაზე უფრო მეტი კონტექსტის სიგრ Summ$^N$ პირველად მონაცემების მონაცემები გაყოფა და მრავალ ფაეზებში შექმნის გარეშე და შემდეგ შექმნის ბოლო გარეშე გარეშე. ჩვენი ფრამეტრი შეიძლება გადატანა ტექსტის გადატანა არბრიტური სიგრძე, რომელიც კონფიგურაცით ტაზების რაოდენობის რაოდენობა, როდესაც LM შეტან მაგრამ, ეს შეიძლება ერთი წიგნის დოკუმენტებით და დიალოგითან გაუყენება, და ის შეიძლება გამოიყენება განსხვავებული აბსტრაქტიგური კოსტრაქტიგური მოდელზე. ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, Summ$^N$ არის პირველი მრავალფედის გაყოფილი და შემდეგ გაყოფილი კონფიგურაციის ფრამეტრი. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ Summ$^N$ წინა გავაკეთებს პირველი სიცოცხლის შესახებ ROUGE სიცოცხლის შესახებ სამი დრო შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ AMI, ICSI და QMSum, ორი დრო ტელეგური სიერიის მონაცემების შესახებ ჩვენი მონაცემები და კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'el': "Η σύνοψη κειμένου βοηθά τους αναγνώστες να συλλάβουν σημαντικές πληροφορίες από έγγραφα, ειδήσεις, συνεντεύξεις και συναντήσεις. Ωστόσο, τα περισσότερα σύγχρονα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα γλωσσών (LM) δεν είναι σε θέση να επεξεργαστούν αποτελεσματικά μακρύ κείμενο για πολλές εργασίες σύνοψης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα απλό, ευέλικτο και αποτελεσματικό πλαίσιο πολλαπλών σταδίων για κείμενα εισαγωγής που είναι μεγαλύτερο από το μέγιστο μήκος περιβάλλοντος των τυπικών προκαθορισμένων LM. Το summ$^N$ χωρίζει πρώτα τα δείγματα δεδομένων και παράγει μια χονδροειδή περίληψη σε πολλαπλά στάδια και στη συνέχεια παράγει την τελική λεπτόκοκκη περίληψη βασισμένη σε αυτό. Το πλαίσιο μας μπορεί να επεξεργαστεί κείμενο εισαγωγής αυθαίρετου μήκους προσαρμόζοντας τον αριθμό των σταδίων διατηρώντας το μέγεθος εισαγωγής σταθερό. Επιπλέον, μπορεί να ασχοληθεί τόσο με έγγραφα μιας πηγής όσο και με διαλόγους, και μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί πάνω από διαφορετικά μοντέλα αφηρημένης σύνοψης σπονδυλικής στήλης. Απ' ό,τι γνωρίζουμε, το Summ$^N$ είναι το πρώτο πολυεπίπεδο πλαίσιο διάσπασης και σύνοψης για τη μακρά σύνοψη εισόδων. Τα πειράματά μας καταδεικνύουν ότι το Summ$^N$ ξεπερνά τις προηγούμενες μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας βελτιώνοντας τις βαθμολογίες σε τρία μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων σύνοψης συσκέψεων AMI, ICSI και QMSum, δύο μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων τηλεοπτικών σειρών από το SummScreen και ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων σύνοψης εγγράφων GovReport. Τα δεδομένα και ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμα στο https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'it': "La sintesi del testo aiuta i lettori a catturare informazioni salienti da documenti, notizie, interviste e riunioni. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei modelli linguistici pre-addestrati all'avanguardia (LM) non è in grado di elaborare in modo efficiente il testo lungo per molte attività di sintesi. In questo articolo, proponiamo Summ$^N$, un framework multi-stage semplice, flessibile ed efficace per i testi di input che sono più lunghi della lunghezza massima del contesto dei tipici LM pretrained. Summ$^N$ prima divide i campioni di dati e genera un riepilogo grossolano in più fasi e quindi produce il riepilogo finale a grana fine basato su di esso. Il nostro framework può elaborare testo di input di lunghezza arbitraria regolando il numero di fasi mantenendo la dimensione di input LM fissa. Inoltre, può trattare sia documenti monosorgente che dialoghi, e può essere utilizzato in aggiunta a diversi modelli di sintesi astratta. Per quanto ne sappiamo, Summ$^N$ è il primo framework multi-stage split-then-summe per una lunga sintesi degli input. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che Summ$^N$ supera i precedenti metodi allo stato dell'arte migliorando i punteggi ROUGE su tre set di dati di sintesi di riunioni lunghe AMI, ICSI e QMSum, due set di dati di serie TV lunghe da SummScreen e un lungo set di dati di sintesi di documenti GovReport. I nostri dati e codice sono disponibili all'indirizzo https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'kk': 'Мәтін тұжырымдамасын оқушыларға құжаттардан, жаңалықтардан, сұрақтардан және тұжырымдамасынан тұратын мәліметті алу көмектеседі. Бірақ, көпшілік күй- жай тіл үлгілері (LM) көпшілігі көпшілікті жинақтау тапсырмалары үшін ұзын мәтінді өзгертуге болмайды. Бұл қағазда, Қосымша $^N$, қарапайым, гибкім және эффективті келтірілген мәтіндер үшін көптеген көптеген мәтіндердің ұзындығынан ұзындығын келтіреміз. Summ$^N$ бірінші деректер үлгілерін бөліп, бірнеше қадамдастырып, оның негізінде соңғы тұтас тұтас жазуын құрады. Біздің қоршау мәтініміз LM келтірілген өлшемін дұрыс сақтағанда тәуелсіздік ұзындығын өзгерте алады. Сонымен қатар, бұл бір көздегі құжаттар мен диалогтармен бірге қатынауға болады, және бұл әртүрлі бағдарламалардың абстрактивті түріндіру үлгілерінде қолданылады. Біздің біліміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, Summ$^N$ бірінші көп-этап бөліп, кейін ұзын келтіру үшін жазылған жұмыс құрылғысы. Біздің тәжірибеміздің тәжірибелеріміз, Тұжырымдық Экрандағы екі ұзын телевизияның деректер жинақтарын AMI, ICSI және QMSum, ұзын құжат жинақтау деректер жинақтарын өзгертіп, ROUGE нәтижелерін үш ұзын тұжырымдық деректер жинақтарын жасап Деректеріміз мен кодымыз бар https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'mk': 'Резултатот на текстот им помага на читателите да земат значајни информации од документите, вестите, интервјуата и состаноците. Сепак, повеќето најсовремени предобучени јазички модели (LM) не можат ефикасно да процесираат долг текст за многу резултати. Во овој документ, предложуваме Сум$^N$, едноставна, флексибилна и ефикасна мултифазивна рамка за влезни тексти кои се подолги од максималната должина на контекст на типичните предобучени ЛМ. Сум$^N$ прво ги подели примероците на податоци и генерира грубо сумирање во неколку фази и потоа го произведува последниот фино растен сумирање базиран на него. Нашата рамка може да процесира внесен текст од арбитрална должина со прилагодување на бројот на фази, при што ќе ја задржи фиксната големина на внесувањето на LM. Покрај тоа, може да се занимава со документи од еден извор и дијалози, и може да се користи врз различни модели за абстрактивна резултатација на грб. Според нашето знаење, Сум$^N$ е првата мултифазична рамка за поделба и потоа резултат за долга резултатација на влогот. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека Summ$^N$ ги надминува претходните најдобри методи со подобрување на ROUGE резултатите на трите долги состаноци податоци за резултати AMI, ICSI и QMSum, два долги телевизиски серии податоци од SummScreen, и долг набор податоци за резултати на документите GovReport. Нашите податоци и код се достапни на https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'lt': 'Teksto santrauka padeda skaitytojams surinkti svarbią informaciją iš dokumentų, naujienų, pokalbių ir susitikimų. Tačiau dauguma naujausių išankstinio mokymo kalbų modelių negali veiksmingai apdoroti ilgo teksto daugeliui santraukų užduočių. Šiame dokumente siūlome santrauką$^N$, paprastą, lanksčią ir veiksmingą daugiapakopį pagrindą įvestiems tekstams, kurie yra ilgesni už didžiausią tipinių iš anksto apmokytų LM konteksto trukmę. Suma$^N$ pirmą kartą suskaičiuoja duomenų mėginius ir gauna didžiulę santrauką keliuose etapuose, o paskui pateikia galutinę smulkiai grūdintą santrauką. Mūsų sistema gali apdoroti savavališko ilgio įvedimo tekstą koreguodama etapų skaičių ir išlaikydama fiksuotą LM įvedimo dydį. Be to, jame gali būti aptariami ir vieno šaltinio dokumentai, ir dialogai, ir jis gali būti naudojamas virš skirtingų stuburo abstrakcinių santraukų modelių. To the best of our knowledge, Summ$^N$ is the first multi-stage split-then-summarize framework for long input summarization.  Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad Summ$^N$ viršija ankstesnius moderniausius metodus gerinant ROUGE rezultatus trijuose ilgų susitikimų santraukų duomenų rinkiniuose AMI, ICSI ir QMSum, dviejuose ilgų televizijos serijų duomenų rinkiniuose SummScreen ir ilgame dokumentų santraukų duomenų rinkinyje GovReport. Mūsų duomenys ir kodas pateikiami https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ms': 'Penapisan teks membantu pembaca menangkap maklumat penting dari dokumen, berita, temuduga, dan mesyuarat. Namun, kebanyakan Model Bahasa Terkini (LM) tidak dapat memproses teks panjang dengan efisien untuk banyak tugas pengringkasan. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar Summ$^N$, kerangka mudah, fleksibel, dan berkesan berbilang-tahap untuk teks input yang lebih panjang daripada panjang konteks maksimum LMs biasa dilatih. Ringkasan$^N$ pertama membahagi sampel data dan menghasilkan ringkasan kasar dalam beberapa tahap dan kemudian menghasilkan ringkasan terakhir-gandum berdasarkan ia. kerangka kami boleh memproses teks input panjang secara arbitrari dengan menyesuaikan bilangan tahap semasa menjaga saiz input LM tetap. Selain itu, ia boleh berurusan dengan kedua-dua dokumen sumber tunggal dan dialog, dan ia boleh digunakan di atas model ringkasan abstraktif tulang belakang yang berbeza. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, Summ$^N$ adalah rangkaian pembagian-kemudian-ringkasan berbilang tahap pertama untuk ringkasan input panjang. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa Summ$^N$ melampaui kaedah-kaedah state-of-the-art terdahulu dengan memperbaiki skor ROUGE pada tiga set data ringkasan mesyuarat panjang AMI, ICSI, dan QMSum, dua set data seri TV panjang dari SummScreen, dan set data ringkasan dokumen panjang GovReport. Our data and code are available at  https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ml': 'വായിക്കാരുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, രേഖകള്\u200d, വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d, ഇന്റര്\u200dവിയേഷന്\u200d, മീറ്റിങുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതി എന്നാലും, കൂടുതല്\u200d ചുരുക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നീണ്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമുള്ള, ഫ്ലാക്സിബിള്\u200d എന്നിവയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി$^N$ പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. എളുപ്പത്തിലുള്ള വാചകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഏറ് $^N$ ആദ്യം ഡേറ്റാ ടാമ്പുകള്\u200d പിരിച്ച് പല സ്റ്റേജില്\u200d ഒരു കോസ്സിന്റെ ചുരുക്കം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് അതിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്ക Our framework can process input text of arbitrary length by adjusting the number of stages while keeping the LM input size fixed.  അതുകൊണ്ടും അത് ഒരേ സോര്\u200dസ്സ് രേഖകളും ഡയലോഗുകളും കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ബാക്കോണിന്റെ മുകളില്\u200d അത് ഉപയോഗി നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ലതിനു വേണ്ടി, നീണ്ട ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ചുരുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി ഒന്നാമത്തെ മുള്\u200dട്ടി$^N$ എന്നാണ്. നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു$^N$ മുമ്പുള്ള രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d മുന്നോട്ടുള്ള രീതിയിലെ രൂപങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. മൂന്നു നീണ്ട മീറ്റിങ് സം നമ്മുടെ ഡേറ്റായും കോഡും ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'mt': 'Is-sommarju tat-test jgħin lill-qarrejja jaqbdu informazzjoni importanti minn dokumenti, aħbarijiet, intervisti, u laqgħat. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel (LM) l-aktar avvanzati ma jistgħux jipproċessaw b’mod effiċjenti test twil għal ħafna kompiti ta’ sommarju. F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu Sommarju$^N$, qafas sempliċi, flessibbli u effettiv f’diversi stadji għal testi ta’ input li huma itwal mit-tul massimu tal-kuntest ta’ LMs tipiċi mħarrġa minn qabel. Is-sommarju$^N$ l-ewwel jaqsam il-kampjuni tad-dejta u jiġġenera sommarju groż f’diversi stadji u mbagħad jipproduċi s-sommarju finali tal-ħbub fin ibbażat fuqu. Our framework can process input text of arbitrary length by adjusting the number of stages while keeping the LM input size fixed.  Barra minn hekk, tista’ tittratta kemm dokumenti ta’ sors uniku kif ukoll djalogi, u tista’ tintuża fuq mudelli differenti ta’ sommarju astrattiv tad-dahar. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, is-Sommarju$^N$ huwa l-ewwel qafas f’diversi stadji maqsum-imbagħad-sommarju għal sommarju ta’ input twil. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li s-Sommarju$^N$ jirriżulta minn metodi l-aktar avvanzati preċedenti billi jtejjeb il-punteġġi ROUGE fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju tal-laqgħat twal AMI, ICSI, u QMSum, żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ serje twila tat-televiżjoni minn SummScreen, u sett twil ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju tad-dokumenti GovReport. Id-dejta u l-kodiċi tagħna huma disponibbli fuq https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'mn': 'Текст хэвлэл уншигчид баримт, мэдээлэл, ярилцлага, уулзалтуудын тусламжтай мэдээллийг барьж авдаг. Гэхдээ ихэнх урлагийн хэл загвар (LM) маш олон жинхэнэ даалгаврын урт текст ашиглаж чадахгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид "Summ$^N$" гэдэг нь энгийн, гишүүмжтэй, үр дүнтэй олон этапын хэлбэрээс илүү өргөн орнуудын хамгийн өргөн өндөртэй LMs-ээс илүү урт байдаг. Summ$^N$ нь эхлээд өгөгдлийн жишээг хувааж, олон хэсэгт давхар жишээг бий болгож, дараа нь эцсийн жимс жимс нийлүүлнэ. Бидний үйл ажиллагаа LM орлуулах хэмжээг тогтмол байлгах үед хэдэн хэмжээсүүдийг тодорхойлж чадна. Дараа нь, энэ нь хоёр нэг эх үүсвэрийн баримт болон диалогуудыг холбож болох бөгөөд энэ нь өөр өөр backbone abstractive summarization models дээр ашиглаж болно. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь, Summ$^N$ бол урт оролцооны хуваалцааны анхны олон этапын хуваалцааны систем юм. Бидний туршилтууд Summ$^N$ нь өмнөх урлагийн арга замыг сайжруулж, ROUGE тоонуудыг гурван удаан уулзалтын өгөгдлийн санг AMI, ICSI, QMSum, SummScreen-ээс хоёр урт телевизийн хэлбэрийн өгөгдлийн санг сайжруулж, урт баримт хэлбэрийн өгөгдлийн санг сайжруулж байна. Бидний мэдээллийн болон код нь https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'pl': 'Podsumowanie tekstu pomaga czytelnikom uchwycić istotne informacje z dokumentów, wiadomości, wywiadów i spotkań. Jednak większość najnowocześniej przeszkolonych modeli językowych (LM) nie jest w stanie skutecznie przetwarzać długiego tekstu dla wielu zadań podsumowujących. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy Summ$^N$, prosty, elastyczny i skuteczny wieloetapowy framework dla tekstów wejściowych, które są dłuższe niż maksymalna długość kontekstu typowych wstępnie trenowanych LM. Summ$^N$ najpierw dzieli próbki danych i generuje grube podsumowanie w wielu etapach, a następnie tworzy ostateczne drobnoziarniste podsumowanie na jego podstawie. Nasz framework może przetwarzać tekst wejściowy o dowolnej długości, dostosowując liczbę etapów przy jednoczesnym utrzymaniu ustalonego rozmiaru wejściowego LM. Ponadto może zajmować się zarówno dokumentami pojedynczego źródła, jak i dialogami, a także może być stosowany na szczycie różnych modeli abstrakcyjnych podsumowań kręgosłupowych. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy Summ$^N$ jest pierwszym wielostopniowym frameworkiem podzielonym, a następnie podsumowującym do długiego podsumowania danych. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że Summ$^N$ przewyższa poprzednie najnowocześniejsze metody poprzez poprawę wyników ROUGE na trzech długich zestawach danych podsumowujących spotkania AMI, ICSI i QMSum, dwóch długich zestawach danych seriali telewizyjnych SummScreen oraz długiego zestawu danych podsumowujących dokumenty GovReport. Nasze dane i kod są dostępne pod adresem: https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ro': 'Rezumatul textelor ajută cititorii să capteze informații importante din documente, știri, interviuri și întâlniri. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea modelelor lingvistice pre-instruite de ultimă generație (LM) nu pot procesa eficient text lung pentru multe sarcini de sintetizare. În această lucrare, propunem Summ$^N$, un cadru simplu, flexibil și eficient în mai multe etape pentru textele de intrare care sunt mai lungi decât lungimea maximă a contextului de LM tipic pre-instruite. Summ$^N$ împărțește mai întâi eșantioanele de date și generează un rezumat grosier în mai multe etape și apoi produce rezumatul final cu granule fine pe baza acestuia. Cadrul nostru poate procesa textul de intrare de lungime arbitrară ajustând numărul de etape, menținând în același timp dimensiunea de intrare LM fixă. În plus, se poate ocupa atât de documente unice, cât și de dialoguri, și poate fi folosit în partea de sus a diferitelor modele de rezumare abstractivă a coloanei vertebrale. Din cele mai bune cunoștințe ale noastre, Summ$^N$ este primul cadru de împărțire-apoi-sumare în mai multe etape pentru rezumarea lungă a intrărilor. Experimentele noastre demonstrează că Summ$^N$ depășește metodele anterioare de ultimă generație prin îmbunătățirea scorurilor ROUGE pe trei seturi de date de rezumare a întâlnirilor lungi AMI, ICSI și QMSum, două seturi de date lungi de seriale TV de la SummScreen și un set lung de date de rezumare a documentelor GovReport. Datele și codul nostru sunt disponibile la adresa https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'no': 'Samandringa av tekst hjelper lesarar å henta salient informasjon frå dokument, nyhetar, intervjuar og møtar. Dette er imidlertid ikkje mogleg å handsama langtekst for mange sammendragsområde i dei fleste tilstandane av kunstmodeller (LM). I denne papiret foreslår vi summ$^N$, eit enkel, fleksibel, og effektivt multistasjonsrammeverk for inndata-tekstar som er lengre enn den maksimale kontekstlengden av typiske LMs som er pretrained. Sammendrag$^N$ deler først dataprøveparane og lagar ein sammendrag i fleire stader og så produserer den siste sammendraga med finn korn basert på den. Rammeverket vårt kan handtera innskriftsteksten med vilkårleg lengd ved å justera talet på stader mens LM innskriftstorleiken er rett. Det kan også handsama både enkelkjeldedokument og dialogvindauge, og det kan brukast på toppen av ulike abstraktive samanseringsmodular for bakgrunnsbene. Til det beste veit vårt kunnskap er summ$^N$ den første fleire staden delt-og-samansering av rammeverket for lang samansering av inndata. Eksperimentane våre viser at Summ$^N$ utfører tidlegare metodar for kunsten ved å forbetra ROUGE- poeng på tre lange møtssamansettingsdatasett AMI, ICSI og QMSum, to lange TV- serie- datasett frå SummScreen og ein lang dokumentsamansettingsdatasett GovReport. Datata og koden våre er tilgjengelege på https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'sr': 'Sažetanje teksta pomaže čitačima da uhvati saliène informacije iz dokumenta, vesti, intervjua i sastanaka. Međutim, većina umjetničkih modela jezika (LM) ne mogu efikasno procesirati dug tekst za mnoge sažetačke zadatke. U ovom papiru predlažemo Summ$^N$, jednostavan, fleksibilan i efikasan multistadijski okvir za tekst ulaska koji su duži od maksimalne dužine konteksta tipičnih pretkišenih LMs. Summ$^N$ prvi razdvaja uzorke podataka i stvara vrhunski sažetak na višestrukim fazama i onda proizvodi konačni sažetak fino zrnca na temelju toga. Naš okvir može procesirati tekst ulaska proizvodnje dužine prilagođavajući broj faza dok držimo veličinu ulaska LM. Osim toga, ona može da se suoči sa jednoizvornim dokumentima i dijalogima, i može se koristiti na vrhu različitih modela abstraktivne sažetke kostiju. Najbolje od našeg znanja, Summ$^N$ je prvi multifazni podjel-onda-sažet okvir za dug sažetak ulaza. N a ši eksperimenti pokazuju da Summ$^N$ iznosi prethodne metode umetnosti poboljšavajući rezultate ROUGE na tri skupljanja podataka o sažetivanju dugih sastanaka AMI, ICSI i QMSum, dve serije podataka o dugim TV serijama iz SummScreen i duge skupljanje podataka GovReport. Naši podaci i kodovi su dostupni na https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'so': 'Qiimeynta qoraalka waxey dadka akhriyey ka caawinaysaa in ay ka qabsadaan macluumaadka iibsashada warqadaha, warqadaha, wareysiga iyo shirarka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee tusaale ahaan luqada oo farshaxanka badan (LM) ma sameyn karaan macluumaad aad u dheer oo aad u sameyn kartid shaqooyin badan oo la soo qoray. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa $^N$, sahlan, flexible, oo faa’iido leh qoraal-qoraal-qoraal ah oo ka dheer xiliga ugu hooseeya xiliga caadiga ah Summi $^N$ marka ugu horeysa ayuu samooyinka danaha kala duduwan u kala qeybiyaa, wuxuuna sameeyaa koorsooyin koorsooyin, markaasna wuxuu soo saaraa dhamaadka ugu dambeysay ee lagu qoray. Shaqooyinkayada waxaa lagu sameyn karaa qoraalka dhererka cadaawayaasha ah, si loo hagaajiyo tirada darajada marka uu u haysto qiyaastii LM. Waxaa sidoo kale loola macaamiloon karaa labada dukumentiyada iyo diyaafadaha oo keliya, waxaana lagu isticmaali karaa tusaalaha jiilaalka ee jimicsiga oo kala duduwan. Tan ugu wanaagsan aqoonteena $^N $ waa kooxaha ugu horeysa jaranjarada kala duduwan-dabadeedna u qorsheysa jimicsiga dheer. Imtixaanadayada ayaa muujiya in Summ$^N$ outperforms previous state-of-the-art methods by improving ROUGE scores on three long meeting summarization data sets AMI, ICSI, and QMSum, two long TV series data sets from SummScreen, and a long document summarization data set GovReport. Our data and code are available at  https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'si': 'පාළුවන් සංවේදනය කියවන්න පාළුවන්ට විසින් තොරතුරු අල්ලගන්න උදව් කරනවා, වාර්තාව, අන්තර්වේ නමුත්, බොහෝ ස්ථානය-of-the-art ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරීන් භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් (LM) නිර්මාණය කරන්න බැරි වුනා වැඩි සුරකුණු වැඩ සඳ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය, ප්\u200dරතිකාරීය, සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරීය සඳහා ඇතුළු පාළුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරීය වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිකාරීය LMs ගැන වඩ summ$^N$ මුලින්ම දත්ත සැම්පල් සිද්ධා කරනවා ඒ වගේම කෝර්ස් සාම්පල් සිද්ධා කරනවා වගේම අන්තිම සාම්පල් සිද්ධා කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂක පරීක්ෂක ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති කරන්න පුළුවන් LM ඇතුළු පරීක්ෂක පරීක්ෂක පරීක්ෂක විසි තවත්, ඒකෙන් එක්ක ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සංවාද දෙන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වගේම ඒක වෙනස් බැක්කෝන් ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණ සංවාද අපේ දන්න හොඳම දේශයෙන්, සම්පූර්ණ $^N$ තමයි පලවෙනි මුලින් මුලින් මුලින් මුලින් ස්ටේජ් වෙන්න, ඊට පස්ස අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට summ$^N$ OutPerfects the preceding state-of-the-art means by improvising ROUGE scores on three long gateway summation data sets AMI, ICSI, and QMSum, 2 long TV series data sets from summScreen, and a long page summation data set Govreport. අපේ දත්ත සහ කෝඩ් තියෙනවා https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'sv': 'Textsammanfattning hjälper läsarna att fånga viktig information från dokument, nyheter, intervjuer och möten. Men de flesta toppmoderna förkränade språkmodeller (LM) kan inte effektivt bearbeta lång text för många sammanfattningsuppgifter. I denna uppsats föreslår vi Summ$^N$, ett enkelt, flexibelt och effektivt ramverk i flera steg för inmatningstexter som är längre än den maximala sammanhangslängden för typiska förkränade LM:er. Summ$^N$ delar först dataproverna och genererar en grov sammanfattning i flera steg och producerar sedan den slutliga finkorniga sammanfattningen baserat på den. Vårt ramverk kan bearbeta inmatningstext av godtycklig längd genom att justera antalet steg samtidigt som LM inmatningsstorleken hålls fast. Dessutom kan den hantera både enstaka källdokument och dialoger, och den kan användas ovanpå olika ryggrad abstrakta sammanfattningsmodeller. Så vitt vi vet är Summ$^N$ det första flerstegs split-then-summe ramverket för lång sammanfattning av indata. Våra experiment visar att Summ$^N$ överträffar tidigare state-of-the-art metoder genom att förbättra ROUGE-poängen på tre långa mötessammanfattningsdatauppsättningar AMI, ICSI och QMSum, två långa TV-seriedataset från SummScreen och en lång dokumentsammanfattningsdatauppsättning GovReport. Våra data och kod finns tillgängliga på https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ta': 'Comment ஆயினும், பெரும்பாலான கலை மொழி மாதிரிகள் (LM) பல சுருக்கும் பணிகளுக்கு நீண்ட உரையை செயல்படுத்த இயலாது. @ info சுருக்கம் $^N$ முதலில் தரவு மாதிரிகளை பிரிக்கும் மற்றும் பல நிலைகளில் ஒரு கோட்டு சுருக்கம் உருவாக்குகிறது பின்னர் அதை அடிப்படையி LM உள்ளீட்டு அளவை வைத்திருக்கும்போது நிலைகளின் எண்ணிக்கையை சரிபார்க்கலாம். மேலும், அது ஒற்றை மூலம் ஆவணங்கள் மற்றும் உரையாடல்களையும் கையாள முடியும், மற்றும் வேறு பின்னோக்குப் பின்னோக்குகளின் மேல எங்கள் அறிவின் சிறந்த முறையில் $^N$ என்பது முதல் பல- நிலையில் பிரிந்து பிரிக்கப்பட்ட பின்னர் நீண்ட உள்ளீட்டு சுருக்க வேண எங்கள் சோதனைகள் $^N$ முந்தைய நிலையில்- கலை முறைமைகளை மேம்படுத்தி ROUGE மதிப்புகளை மூன்று நீண்ட சந்திப்பு சுருக்க தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் AMI, ICSI, மற்றும் QMSum, சுருக்குத் திரையிலிருந் எங்கள் தகவல் மற்றும் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ur': 'لکھنے کے سامنے پڑھنے والوں کی مدد کرتی ہے کہ دکھانے، خبریں، انٹوریوں، اور ملاقات کے ذریعہ سے صاف معلومات حاصل کریں۔ However, most state-of-the-art pretrained language models (LM) are unable to efficiently process long text for many summarization tasks. اس کاغذ میں ہم جم$^N$ کی پیشنهاد کریں گے، ایک ساده, ہلکسب، اور اثبات multi-stage متن متن کے لئے بہت عمدہ متن لہروں سے زیادہ دور ہیں Summ$^N$ پہلے ڈیٹ سمبل کو تقسیم کرتا ہے اور بہت سی مرحلے میں کورس کا سامنہ پیدا کرتا ہے اور پھر اس پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے آخری نیک دانے کا سامنہ پیدا کرتا ہے. ہمارے فرمیٹ کا اندازہ لہروں کے اندازے سے اپنا پیغام پیدا کر سکتا ہے اور LM اپنا اندازہ مضبوط رکھنے کے موقع استعمال کرتا ہے. اس کے علاوہ، یہ دونوں واحد سورس سند اور диалогوں کے ساتھ استعمال کر سکتا ہے، اور یہ مختلف پک ہڈی کے بالوں پر استعمال کر سکتا ہے۔ ہمارے بہترین علم کے لئے Summ$^N$ سب سے پہلے multi-stage split-then-summarize frameworks ہے۔ ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ Summ$^N$ پہلے کی حالت-of-the-art methodologies سے روUGE اسکو تین طویل میٹ میٹ ڈیٹ سٹ AMI, ICSI, اور QMSum کے ذریعہ سے improving کرتا ہے، دو طویل تلویزیون سٹ ڈیٹ سٹ، اور ایک طویل سند ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیٹ سٹ GovReport میں. ہمارے ڈاکٹے اور کوڈ موجود ہیں https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'uz': "Name Lekin ko'pchilik soniyalar taʼminlovchi tillar modellari (LM) ko'pchilik hisoblari uchun uzoq matnni juda foydalana olmaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz oddiy, fleksiblik va foydalanilgan narsalarning ko'plab-darajadagi narsalarni $^N$ yuklashni talab qilamiz. Biz oddiy qo'shilgan LMs. ning eng katta darajada ko'proq darajada @ info: whatsthis Freymmiz arbitral uzunligi matnni LM kiritish oʻlchamini oʻzgartirishi mumkin. Шунингдек, у битта манбаъ ҳужжатлар ва dialoglar bilan boshqarishi мумкин, va bu boshqa tuzuvga avtomatik harakat qilish modellarida foydalanishi mumkin. Bizning eng eng yaxshi aniqligimizga $^N dollari ajratish birinchi ko'plab-darajada ajratilgan ajratuvchidir. @ info Bizning maʼlumot va kodlash mumkin https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'vi': 'Bản tóm tắt văn bản giúp độc giả thu thập thông tin nổi bật từ các tài liệu, tin tức, phỏng vấn và các cuộc họp. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các mô- đun ngôn ngữ được hình trước nghệ thuật (LM) không thể xử lý văn bản dài hiệu quả cho nhiều công việc tóm tắt. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất Tóm tắt tập hợp này, một hệ thống đơn giản, linh hoạt và hiệu quả đa giai đoạn cho các văn bản nhập còn dài hơn chiều dài của xu hướng hình mẫu điển hình. Lúc đầu thì đã chia ra các mẫu dữ liệu và tạo ra một bản tóm tắt tổng hợp trong nhiều giai đoạn và sau đó đưa ra bản tóm tắt cuối cùng được tô màu dựa vào nó. Cơ chế của chúng tôi có thể xử lý văn bản nhập ngẫu nhiên bằng cách điều chỉnh số giai đoạn trong khi giữ kích cỡ nhập LM được định. Hơn nữa, nó có thể xử lý cả các tài liệu độc lập và các ca- trình, và nó có thể được dùng trên các mô hình tổng hợp xương sống khác nhau. Theo kiến thức tốt nhất của chúng ta, thì Tóm tắt nguồn đầu tiên là bộ dạng đa giai đoạn cho mô tả dài. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng Trú: -...siêu thực hiện các phương pháp hiện đại trước đây bằng cách cải thiện ghi số của ROG trên ba bộ nhớ tổng hợp dài tập tin AMI, ICSI, và QSIum, hai bộ dữ liệu truyền hình dài từ Sơ Thành Màn hình, và một bộ nhớ tổng hợp dữ liệu. Dữ liệu và mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'bg': 'Обобщението на текста помага на читателите да улавят важна информация от документи, новини, интервюта и срещи. Въпреки това, повечето съвременни предварително обучени езикови модели (ЛМ) не могат ефективно да обработват дълъг текст за много задачи за обобщаване. В тази статия предлагаме проста, гъвкава и ефективна многоетапна рамка за входни текстове, които са по-дълги от максималната дължина на контекста на типичните предварително тренирани ЛМ. Summ$^N$ първо разделя пробите от данни и генерира грубо резюме на няколко етапа и след това произвежда окончателното фино резюме въз основа на него. Нашата рамка може да обработва входен текст с произволна дължина, като коригира броя на етапите, като същевременно запазва размера на входа фиксиран. Освен това, той може да се занимава както с документи от един източник, така и диалози, и може да се използва върху различни основни абстрактни модели за обобщаване. Доколкото знаем, е първата многостепенна рамка за разделяне и обобщаване на входните данни. Нашите експерименти показват, че превъзхожда предишните най-съвременни методи чрез подобряване на резултатите на три набора данни за обобщаване на дълги срещи и два дълги набора данни за обобщаване на документи и дълъг набор от данни за обобщаване на документи. Нашите данни и код са достъпни на адрес: https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'nl': 'Tekst samenvatting helpt lezers bij het vastleggen van belangrijke informatie uit documenten, nieuws, interviews en vergaderingen. De meeste state-of-the-art voorgetrainde taalmodellen (LM) zijn echter niet in staat om lange tekst efficiënt te verwerken voor veel samenvattingstaken. In dit artikel stellen we Summ$^N$voor, een eenvoudig, flexibel en effectief multi-stage framework voor invoerteksten die langer zijn dan de maximale contextlengte van typische vooraf getrainde LMs. Summ$^N$ splitst eerst de gegevensmonsters en genereert een grove samenvatting in meerdere fasen en produceert vervolgens de uiteindelijke fijnkorrelige samenvatting op basis daarvan. Ons framework kan invoertekst van willekeurige lengte verwerken door het aantal fasen aan te passen terwijl de LM invoergrootte vast blijft. Bovendien kan het omgaan met zowel single-source documenten als dialogen, en het kan worden gebruikt bovenop verschillende backbone abstractieve samenvattingsmodellen. Voor zover wij weten, is Summ$^N$ het eerste multi-stage split-then-summate framework voor lange input samenvatting. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat Summ$^N$ eerdere state-of-the-art methoden overtreft door ROUGE scores te verbeteren op drie lange meeting samenvattingsdatasets AMI, ICSI en QMSum, twee lange tv series datasets van SummScreen en een lange document samenvattingsdataset GovReport. Onze gegevens en code zijn beschikbaar op https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'da': "Tekstopsummering hjælper læserne med at indsamle vigtige oplysninger fra dokumenter, nyheder, interviews og møder. De fleste avancerede sprogmodeller (LM) er imidlertid ikke i stand til effektivt at behandle lang tekst til mange opsummeringsopgaver. I denne artikel foreslår vi Summ$^N$, en enkel, fleksibel og effektiv multi-trins ramme for input tekster, der er længere end den maksimale kontekstlængde af typiske forudtrænede LM'er. Summ$^N$ opdeler først dataprøverne og genererer et grovt resumé i flere faser og producerer derefter det endelige finkornede resumé baseret på det. Vores framework kan behandle input tekst af vilkårlig længde ved at justere antallet af faser, mens LM input størrelse holdes fast. Desuden kan det beskæftige sig med både enkeltkildsdokumenter og dialoger, og det kan bruges oven på forskellige backbone abstractive resumémodeller. Så vidt vi ved, er Summ$^N$ den første multi-trins split-then-summe ramme til lang input summering. Vores eksperimenter viser, at Summ$^N$ overgår tidligere state-of-the-art metoder ved at forbedre ROUGE scores på tre lange mødedatasæt AMI, ICSI og QMSum, to lange tv-serier datasæt fra SummScreen, og et langt dokumentopsummeringsdatasæt GovReport. Vores data og kode er tilgængelige på https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'hr': 'Sažetanje teksta pomaže čitačima da uhvati salične informacije iz dokumenta, vijesti, intervjua i sastanaka. Međutim, većina umjetničkih modela (LM) ne mogu učinkovito obraditi dug tekst za mnoge sažetačke zadatke. U ovom papiru predlažemo Summ$^N$, jednostavan, fleksibilan i učinkovit multistadijski okvir za tekst ulaza koji su duži od maksimalne dužine konteksta tipičnih predivnih LMs-a. Summ$^N$ prvi razdvaja uzorke podataka i stvara vrhunski sažetak na višestrukim fazama, a zatim proizvodi konačni sažetak fino zrnca na temelju njega. Naš okvir može obraditi tekst ulaska proizvodnje dužine prilagođavajući broj faza dok držimo veličinu ulaska LM-a određenu. Osim toga, može se riješiti i sa jednoizvornim dokumentima i dijalogima, i može se koristiti na vrhu različitih modela abstraktivne sažetke kostiju. Najbolje od naših znanja, Summ$^N$ je prvi višefazni okvir podjela-onda-sažeta za dugi sažetak ulaza. N a ši eksperimenti pokazuju da Summ$^N$ iznosi prethodne metode umjetnosti poboljšavajući rezultate ROUGE na tri skupljanja podataka o sažetivanju dugih sastanaka AMI, ICSI i QMSum, dvije podatake iz dugih TV serija iz SummScreen i duge skupljanje podataka GovReport. Naši podaci i kodovi su dostupni na https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'de': 'Textzusammenfassung hilft Lesern, wichtige Informationen aus Dokumenten, Nachrichten, Interviews und Meetings zu erfassen. Allerdings sind die meisten modernen vortrainierten Sprachmodelle (LM) nicht in der Lage, langen Text für viele Zusammenfassungsaufgaben effizient zu verarbeiten. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir Summ$^N$vor, ein einfaches, flexibles und effektives mehrstufiges Framework für Eingabetexte, die länger als die maximale Kontextlänge typischer vortrainierter LMs sind. Summ$^N$ teilt zuerst die Datenproben auf und generiert eine grobe Zusammenfassung in mehreren Stufen und erzeugt dann die abschließende feinkörnige Zusammenfassung basierend darauf. Unser Framework kann Eingabetext beliebiger Länge verarbeiten, indem die Anzahl der Stufen angepasst wird, während die LM-Eingabegröße festgelegt bleibt. Darüber hinaus kann es sowohl mit Single-Source-Dokumenten als auch Dialogen umgehen und kann auf verschiedenen Backbone-abstraktiven Zusammenfassungsmodellen verwendet werden. Nach bestem Wissen ist Summ$^N$ das erste mehrstufige Split-then-Summit-Framework für lange Eingabezusammenfassungen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass Summ$^N$ frühere State-of-the-Art-Methoden übertrifft, indem es die ROUGE-Scores auf drei langen Meeting-Zusammenfassungsdatensätzen AMI, ICSI und QMSum, zwei langen TV-Serien-Datensätzen von SummScreen und einem langen Dokument-Zusammenfassungsdatensatz GovReport verbessert. Unsere Daten und Codes finden Sie unter https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'id': 'Penapisan teks membantu pembaca menangkap informasi penting dari dokumen, berita, wawancara, dan pertemuan. However, most state-of-the-art pretrained language models (LM) are unable to efficiently process long text for many summarization tasks.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan Summ$^N$, rangkaian sederhana, fleksibel, dan efektif multi-tahap untuk teks input yang lebih panjang dari panjang konteks maksimum LMs biasa dilatih. Summ$^N$ pertama membagi sampel data dan menghasilkan ringkasan kasar dalam berbagai tahap dan kemudian menghasilkan ringkasan akhir-fine grained berdasarkan itu. kerangka kami dapat memproses teks masukan panjang secara arbitrar dengan menyesuaikan jumlah tahap sementara menjaga ukuran masukan LM tetap. Selain itu, ia dapat berurusan dengan dokumen sumber tunggal dan dialog, dan dapat digunakan di atas model abstraksi perbedaan tulang belakang. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, Summ$^N$ adalah rangkaian pertama multi-tahap pembagian-kemudian-ringkasan untuk ringkasan input panjang. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa Summ$^N$ melebihi metode state-of-the-art sebelumnya dengan meningkatkan skor ROUGE pada tiga set data pertemuan panjang AMI, ICSI, dan QMSum, dua set data seri TV panjang dari SummScreen, dan set data pendapatan dokumen panjang GovReport. Data dan kode kami tersedia di https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ko': '텍스트 요약은 독자가 문서, 뉴스, 취재, 회의에서 중요한 정보를 얻는 데 도움을 준다.그러나 대부분의 최첨단 예습 언어 모델 (LM) 은 많은 요약 작업의 긴 텍스트를 효과적으로 처리할 수 없다.본고에서 우리는Summ$^N$, 간단하고 유연하며 효과적인 다단계 입력 텍스트 구조를 제시했는데 그 길이는 전형적인 예비훈련 LMs의 최대 상하문 길이를 초과했다.Summ$^N$먼저 데이터 샘플을 분할하고 여러 단계에서 대략적인 요약을 생성한 다음 그것에 따라 최종 세립도 요약을 생성합니다.우리의 프레임워크는 LM의 입력 크기가 변하지 않는 상황에서 단계수를 조정하여 임의의 길이의 입력 텍스트를 처리할 수 있다.또한 원본 문서와 대화를 처리할 수 있고 서로 다른 주요 추상적 요약 모델에서 사용할 수 있다.Summ$^N$은 요약을 길게 입력하는 데 사용되는 첫 번째 다단계 분할 요약 프레임워크로 알고 있습니다.우리의 실험에 의하면 Summ$^N$은 세 개의 긴 회의 요약 데이터 집합인 AMI, ICSI와 QMSum, SummScreen의 두 개의 긴 드라마 데이터 집합과 한 개의 긴 문서 요약 데이터 집합인 GovReport에서 ROUGE 점수를 높여 이전의 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.우리의 데이터와 코드는https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'fa': 'جمع کردن متن به خوانندگان کمک می\u200cکند که اطلاعات استفاده از سند، اخبار، مصاحبه\u200cها و جلسه\u200cها را بگیرند. ولی بیشترین مدل زبان\u200cهای پیش\u200cفرض\u200cشده\u200cی حالت هنری (LM) نمی\u200cتوانند متن طولانی را برای بسیاری از کارهای جمع\u200cآوری انجام دهند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم Summ$^N$، یک چهارچوب ساده، flexible و موثر چند مرحله برای متن ورودی که بیشتر از عمومین طول محیط عمومی از LMs پیش ریخته شده است. اول نمونه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را تقسیم می\u200cکند و در چندین مرحله\u200cها جمع می\u200cکند و سپس جمع نهایی دانه\u200cهای خوشمزه را بر اساس آن تولید می\u200cکند. چهارچوب ما می تواند متن ورودی از طول تصادفی را با تنظیم تعداد مرحله در زمان نگه داشتن اندازه ورودی LM ثابت کند. علاوه بر این، می\u200cتواند با سند\u200cهای یک منبع و диалог برخورد کند، و می\u200cتواند از بالای مدل\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری پشت استخوان\u200cهای مختلف استفاده شود. برای بهترین دانش ما، Summ$^N$ اولین چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که Summ$^N$ روش\u200cهای اولیه\u200cی هنر را با improving ROUGE scores on three long meeting summarization datasets AMI, ICSI, and QMSum، دو series of TV long data from SummScreen و یک مجموعه\u200cی جمع\u200cسازی داده\u200cهای طولانی GovReport از جمع\u200cسازی مدت عمومی انجام می\u200cدهد. اطلاعات و کد ما در دسترس هستند https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'tr': 'Metin Toplaýyşy okuwçylara senden, täzeliklerden, görüşmelerden, ýygnaklardan gatnaşmaga kömek edip otyrýar. Ýöne, sanat täzelikleriniň köp görkezilen dili nusgalary (LM) köp bellenen täzelikleri üçin uzak metin işlemedi. Bu kagyzda, biz jemgyýet$^N$, basit, fleksibil we etkinlik giriş tekstleriň iň köp sahypalarynyň ululykdan uzyn, Toplum$^N$ ilkinji gezek maglumatlary namaýyşlaryny böldi we köp taýýarlar we soňra fin-taýýarlar toplamy üstine çykar. Biziň çeräbimiz LM girdi ululykyny sabitleýänçä taýýarlap täze durlygy üçin girdi metini proses edip biler. Mundan hem bir çeşme senedi we dialoglary bilen çözebilir we muny farklı arkalaryň üstünde ullanabilir. Bilgimiziň iň gowy bolsa, Toplum$^N$ uluslary üçin birinji multi-stadij bölüşmek we soňra jemgyýet etmek üçin. Biziň deneylerimiz Toplum$^N$ sanat çykyşlarynyň öňki durumyndan ROUGE sanlaryny üç uzak ýygnak datajylary AMI, ICSI we QMSum, Toplum ekranyň iki uzun telewizor sanlarynyň üstine çykarýandygyny görkez. Biziň maglumatymyz we kodymyz bar https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa maandishi unawasaidia wasomaji kuchukua taarifa za mauzaji kutoka nyaraka, habari, mahojiano na mikutano. Hata hivyo, mifano mingi ya lugha ya sanaa iliyoendelea (LM) hayawezi kuchukua maandishi ndefu kwa ajili ya kazi nyingi za muhtasari. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza Mkutano wa $^N, mfumo rahisi, na wenye ufanisi na ufanisi wa kuandika ujumbe wa vifaa vinavyoendelea zaidi kuliko kiwango kikubwa cha ukomo wa kawaida wa LMs. Mkutano wa $^N kwa mara ya kwanza hugawanya sampuli za taarifa na kutengeneza muhtasari wa treni katika hatua mbalimbali na kisha huzalisha muhtasari wa muhtasari wa mwisho wa kutoa faini kwa msingi wake. Miundombi yetu inaweza kuchukua maandishi ya kiholela kwa kurekebisha idadi ya hatua wakati wa kuweka kiwango kikubwa cha LM. Zaidi ya hayo, inaweza kukabiliana na nyaraka na mazungumzo ya moja kwa moja, na inaweza kutumika juu ya mifano ya muhtasari tofauti ya mifupa. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, Mkutano wa$^N ni mfumo wa kwanza wa jukwaa la kwanza unapambanuka kwa muhtasari wa muda mrefu wa maudhui. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba Mkutano wa $^N unaendesha mbinu zilizopita za hali ya sanaa kwa kuboresha vipindi vya habari vya ROUGE katika taarifa za muhtasari wa muda mrefu za mkutano AMI, ICSI, na QMSum, seti mbili za mfululizo wa televisheni za muda mrefu kutoka Summit Screen, na taarifa za muhtasari wa nyaraka za muda mrefu. Takwimu na sheria zetu zinapatikana katika https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'af': "Teks opsomming hulp aan lesers om salient inligting van dokumente, nuus, intervjuis en meetings te vang. Maar die meeste state-of-the-art-pretrained taal modele (LM) is nie moontlik om lank teks te proses vir baie opsommingstaak te doen nie. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons opsomming$^N$, 'n eenvoudig, fleksibel en effektief multistadige raamwerk vir invoer teks wat langer is as die maksimum kontekslengte van tipiese pretreënde LMs. Opsomming$^N$ verdeel eerste die data voorbeelde en genereer 'n kors opsomming in veelvuldige stadige en dan produseer die eindelike fin-koring opsomming gebaseer op dit. Ons raamwerk kan toevoer teks van arbitrêre lengte proses deur die aantal stadige aanpasse terwyl die LM invoer grootte vasgestel word. Dit kan ook behandel met beide enkel-bron dokumente en dialoog, en dit kan gebruik word op bo van verskillende agterbêne abstraktiewe opsomming modele. Na die beste van ons kennis is die eerste multistadige splitting-then-opsomming raamwerk vir lang invoer opsomming. Ons eksperimente wys dat Opsomming$^N$ voortgaan vorige state- of- the- art metodes deur die verbetering van ROUGE telling op drie lang vergadering opsomming datastel AMI, ICSI en QMSum, twee lang TV serie datastel van opsomming Skerm en 'n lang dokument opsomming datastel GovReport. Ons data en kode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ማጠቃለያ አካባቢዎች ከሰነዶች፣ ዜና፣ የስብሰባዎች እና ስብሰባዎች ማጠቃለያዎችን እንዲያዙ ይረዳል፡፡ ነገር ግን አብዛኛዎቹ የቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች (LM) በብዙ አካባቢ ስራዎችን ለመፍጠር የረጅም ጽሑፍ ለመፍጠር አይችሉም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ቀላል፣ flexible እና ለጥያቄ ጽሑፎች ለጥያቄ ጽሑፎች ለመጠቀም እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ መጀመሪያ $^N ዶላር የዳታ ምሳሌዎችን ለጥፍ እና የኮርፖር ማጠቃለያ በሁለት ደረጃዎች ውስጥ ፍጥረዋል፡፡ የፍሬማችን የክፍለ ርዝመት ጽሑፉን በመጠበቅ የLM input መጠን በመጠበቅ የደረጃውን ቁጥር በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ በአንድ ምንጭ ሰነዱን እና አዲስ መስኮቶችን ይጨመር ይችላል፣ በተለየ የጀርባ አቋራጭ አቋራጭ ምሳሌዎችን ላይ ይቻላል፡፡ ከውቀታችን የተሻለ ነው $^N ዶላር መጀመሪያ የብዙ ደረጃዎች የተለያየ-ከዚያም ለረጅም የውጤት አቀማሚ ፍሬም ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን $^N$ የቀድሞውን የ-የ-አርድ ሥርዓት በሦስት ረጅም ጉዳዩ ማጠቃለያ ዳታዎችን AMI፣ ICSI እና QMS፣ ሁለት ረጅም የቴሌቪዥን ዳታዎችን ከSummScreen እና ረጅም የረጅም ሰነድ ማጠቃለያ ዳታተሮችን በመጠቀም ያሳያል፡፡ ዳራሻችንና ኮድ https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'hy': "Տեքստի համառոտագրությունը օգնում է կարդացողներին վերցնել փաստաթղթերից, նորություններից, հարցազրույցներից և հանդիպումներից կարևոր տեղեկատվություն: Այնուամենայնիվ, ամենաբարձր լեզվի մոդելների մեծամասնությունը չի կարողանում արդյունավետ վերլուծել երկար տեքստը շատ համառոտագրական խնդիրների համար: In this paper, we propose Summ$^N$, a simple, flexible, and effective multi-stage framework for input texts that are longer than the maximum context length of typical pretrained LMs.  Սկզբում Summ$^N$ բաժանում է տվյալների նմուշները և ստեղծում է բազմաթիվ աստիճաններում խոր համառոտագրություն, հետո ստեղծում է այն հիմնված վերջնական գեղեցիկ համառոտագրությունը: Մեր կառուցվածքը կարող է գործընթացնել ցանկացած երկարությամբ ներմուծի տեքստը՝ հարմարեցնելով բեմների քանակը, մինչդեռ LM-ի ներմուծի չափը հաստատուն է պահելով: Այնուամենայնիվ, այն կարող է վերաբերվել մեկ աղբյուրի փաստաթղթերի և երկխոսությունների հետ, և այն կարող է օգտագործվել տարբեր հետևի ոսկորի վերացական ամփոփման մոդելների վրա: Մեր գիտելիքներից լավագույնն այն է, որ Summ$^N$ երկար ներմուծների համառոտագրման համար առաջին բազմաաստիճանի բաժանված-հետո-համառոտագրման շրջանակն է: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ Summ$^N$ արտադրում է նախորդ բարձրագույն մեթոդներ' բարելավելով ROUGe-ի գնահատականները երեք երկար հանդիպումների համառոտագրման տվյալների համակարգերի AMI, ICI և QMSum-ի վրա, SummSken-ի երկու երկար հեռուստատեսական համակարգերի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, և երկար Մեր տվյալները և կոդը հասանելի են https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'sq': 'Përmbledhja e tekstit ndihmon lexuesit të marrin informacione të rëndësishme nga dokumentet, lajmet, intervistat dhe takimet. Megjithatë, shumica e modeleve të gjuhës më të moderne të paramësuara (LM) nuk janë në gjendje të procesojnë efektivisht tekstin e gjatë për shumë detyra të përmbledhjes. N ë këtë letër, ne propozojmë Summ$^N$, një kuadër të thjeshtë, fleksibel dhe efektiv shumëfazor për tekstet e hyrjes që janë më të gjata se gjatësia maksimale e kontekstit të LMs tipike të parastërvitur. Summ$^N$ ndan së pari mostrat e të dhënave dhe gjeneron një përmbledhje të mëdha në faza të shumta dhe pastaj prodhon përmbledhjen përfundimtare të hollësishme në bazë të saj. Korniza jonë mund të procesojë tekstin e hyrjes me gjatësi arbitrare duke rregulluar numrin e fazave duke mbajtur madhësinë e hyrjes LM të fiksuar. Përveç kësaj, ajo mund të trajtojë si dokumentet me burim të vetëm, ashtu edhe dialoget dhe mund të përdoret në majë të modeleve të ndryshme abstraktive të përmbledhjes së shpinës. To the best of our knowledge, Summ$^N$ is the first multi-stage split-then-summarize framework for long input summarization.  Eksperimentet tona demonstrojnë se Summ$^N$ paraqet metodat e mëparshme të state-of-the-art duke përmirësuar rezultatet ROUGE në tre grupe të dhënash të përmbledhjes së takimeve të gjata AMI, ICSI dhe QMSum, dy grupe të dhënash të gjata të serive TV nga SummScreen dhe një grup të dhënash të përmbledhjes së dokumenteve GovReport. Të dhënat dhe kodet tona janë në dispozicion në https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'bn': 'টেক্সটের সারসংক্ষেপ পাঠকদের সাহায্য করে ডকুমেন্ট, সংবাদ, সাক্ষাৎকার এবং সাক্ষাৎকার থেকে ব্যবস্থার ত However, most state-of-the-art pretrained language models (LM) are unable to efficiently process long text for many summarization tasks.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সামার $^N$ প্রস্তাব করছি, একটি সাধারণ, ফ্লিক্সিয়াল এবং কার্যকর ইনপুট ট টেক্সটের জন্য মাল্টিমেন্টের কার্যক্রমের প্রস্তাব করি, যা স সাম্প $^N ডলার প্রথম ডাটা নম্বর বিভক্ত করে বিভিন্ন স্তরে কোর্স সার্মার তৈরি করে এবং তারপর তা ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে চূড়ান্ত সার্গার ত এলএম ইনপুটের আকার ঠিক রাখার সময় আমাদের ফ্রেমার্কের মাধ্যমে বৈধতার দীর্ঘদিনের লেখা প্রক্রিয়া করতে পারে। এছাড়াও এটি একক উৎসের নথি এবং ডায়ালগের সাথে মিলিয়ে নিতে পারে, আর এটি বিভিন্ন ব্যাকবোনের সারসংক্রান্ত মডেলে ব্যবহার করতে পারে। আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোর জন্য, দীর্ঘ ইনপুটের সার্মিজেশনের জন্য বিভক্ত প্রথম মাল্টিমেন্ট বিভক্ত-পর্যন্ত সংক্ষেপের আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে সাম্প্রীনের দুই দীর্ঘ টেলিভিশন সিরিজ ডাটাসেট এবং সাম্প্রিনের দীর্ঘ নথির সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্ষেপের মাধ্যমে রুজের স্কোর উন্নতি করে প আমাদের তথ্য এবং কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'az': "Mətn qurğulaması oxuyanlara belələr, xəbərlər, mühbətlər və toplantılardan istifadə edilən məlumatları almağa kömək edir. Lakin, sanatın çoxu təmizlənmiş dil modelləri (LM) çoxlu təmizlənmiş işlər üçün uzun metin işlədə bilməz. Bu kağızda Summ$^N$ təklif edirik, basit, fleksibil və müxtəlif çoxlu-fərqli yazılmış mətnlərin ən yüksək məlumatın uzunluğundan daha uzun. Summ$^N$ ilk dəfə verilən nümunələri parçalayır və çoxlu dəfələrdə qarışıq bir toplantı yaradır və sonra sonuncu sünbül toplantını ürəkləyir. Bizim qurğumuz LM girdi böyüklüyünü sabitleyici halda fərqli səviyyələrin sayını düzəltərək istifadə edə bilər. Əksinə, bu hər ikisini tək mənbə belələri və dialogları ilə çəkə bilər, və bu müxtəlif arxa sümük abstraktiv sümük modellerinin üstündə istifadə edilə bilər. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına gəldikdə Summ$^N$ uzun girdi təmizlənməsi üçün ilk çoxlu fərqli bölünmə və sonra təmizlənmə framewordur. Bizim təcrübələrimiz, Summ$^N$ əvvəlki təcrübə metodlarını üç uzun görüşmə təcrübəsi veri qurğuları AMI, ICSI və QMSum, SummScreen'dan iki uzun televizyon seriyası veri qurğuları və uzun belədir təcrübə qurğuları GovReport'da yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün keçmişdir. Məlumatlarımız və kodlarımız https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'cs': 'Shrnutí textu pomáhá čtenářům zachytit významné informace z dokumentů, zpráv, rozhovorů a schůzek. Nicméně většina moderních předtrénovaných jazykových modelů (LM) není schopna efektivně zpracovat dlouhý text pro mnoho souhrnných úloh. V tomto článku navrhujeme Summ$^N$, jednoduchý, flexibilní a efektivní vícestupňový rámec pro vstupní texty, které jsou delší než maximální délka kontextu typických předtrénovaných LM. Summ$^N$ nejprve rozdělí vzorky dat a generuje hrubé shrnutí ve více fázích a pak vytvoří konečné jemnozrnné shrnutí na základě něj. Náš framework může zpracovávat vstupní text libovolné délky nastavením počtu stupňů při zachování pevné velikosti vstupu LM. Kromě toho se může zabývat jak dokumenty z jednoho zdroje, tak dialogy a může být použit na vrcholu různých páteřních abstraktivních souhrnných modelů. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí je Summ$^N$ první vícestupňový rozdělený a pak shrnutý rámec pro dlouhé shrnutí vstupů. Naše experimenty ukazují, že Summ$^N$ překonává předchozí nejmodernější metody tím, že zlepšuje ROUGE skóre na třech dlouhých datových sadách pro shrnutí schůzek AMI, ICSI a QMSum, dvou dlouhých datových sadách televizních seriálů SummScreen a datové sadě pro shrnutí dlouhých dokumentů GovReport. Naše data a kód jsou k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'bs': 'Sažetanje teksta pomaže čitačima da uhvati salične informacije iz dokumenta, vijesti, intervjua i sastanaka. Međutim, većina umjetničkih modela (LM) ne mogu efikasno procesirati dug tekst za mnoge sažetačke zadatke. U ovom papiru predlažemo Summ$^N$, jednostavan, fleksibilan i učinkovit multifazni okvir za tekst ulaska koji su duži od maksimalne dužine konteksta tipičnih pretkišenih LMs. Summ$^N$ prvi razdvaja uzorke podataka i stvara vrhunski sažetak na višestrukim fazama i onda proizvodi konačni sažetak fino zrnca na temelju njega. Naš okvir može obraditi tekst ulaska proizvodnje dužine prilagođavajući broj faza dok drži veličinu ulaska LM određenu. Osim toga, može se riješiti i sa jednoizvornim dokumentima i dijalogima, i može se koristiti na vrhu različitih modela abstraktivne sažetke kostiju. Najbolje od našeg znanja, Summ$^N$ je prvi multifazni podjel-onda-sažet okvir za dugi sažetak ulaza. N a ši eksperimenti pokazuju da Summ$^N$ iznosi prethodne metode umjetnosti poboljšavajući rezultate ROUGE na tri skupine podataka o sažetivanju dugih sastanaka AMI, ICSI i QMSum, dvije skupine podataka dugih TV serija iz SummScreen i duge skupine podataka GovReport. Naši podaci i kodovi su dostupni na https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'et': 'Teksti kokkuvõte aitab lugejatel jäädvustada olulist teavet dokumentidest, uudistest, intervjuudest ja koosolekutest. Enamik kaasaegseid eeltreenitud keelemudeleid (LM) ei suuda tõhusalt töödelda pikka teksti paljude kokkuvõtteülesannete jaoks. Selles töös pakume välja Summ$^N$, lihtsa, paindliku ja tõhusa mitmeastmelise raamistiku sisendtekstidele, mis on pikemad kui tüüpiliste eeltreenitud LMide maksimaalne kontekstipikkus. Summ$^N$ jagab esmalt andmeproovid ja genereerib mitmes etapis jämeda kokkuvõtte ning seejärel koostab selle põhjal lõpliku peeneteralise kokkuvõtte. Meie raamistik suudab töödelda suvalise pikkusega sisendteksti, reguleerides etappide arvu, hoides samal ajal LM sisendi suuruse fikseeritud. Lisaks sellele võib see käsitleda nii ühe allika dokumente kui dialooge ning seda saab kasutada erinevate selgroo abstraktsete kokkuvõtlusmudelite lisaks. Meie teadmiste kohaselt on Summ$^N$ esimene mitmeastmeline jagatud-seejärel kokkuvõtlik raamistik pikaks sisendite kokkuvõtlikuks koostamiseks. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et Summ$^N$ ületab varasemaid kaasaegseid meetodeid, parandades ROUGE tulemusi kolmel pikal koosoleku kokkuvõtte andmekogumil AMI, ICSI ja QMSum, kahel pikal telesarja andmekogumil SummScreenilt ja pikal dokumendi kokkuvõtte andmekogumil GovReport. Meie andmed ja kood on kättesaadavad aadressil https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ca': "La resumida del text ajuda als lectors a captar informació salient dels documents, notícies, entrevistes i reunions. Tot i així, la majoria dels models de llenguatge avançats (LM) no són capaços de processar eficientment el text llarg per a moltes tasques de resum. En aquest paper, proposem suma$^N$, un marc simple, flexible i eficaç de múltiples etapes per als textos d'entrada que són més llargs que la llargada màxima del context de les ML típices pré-entrenades. La suma$^N$ primer divideix les mostres de dades i genera un resum gros en múltiples etapes i després produeix el resum final de grans fins basat en ella. El nostre marc pot processar el text d'entrada de llargada arbitraria ajustant el nombre d'etapes mentre mantenint la mida d'entrada LM fixa. A més, pot tractar-se dels documents d'una sola font i els diàlegs, i es pot utilitzar a sobre de diferents models de resum abstractiu de la columna vertebral. Segons el nostre coneixement, Summ$^N$ és el primer marc multietapa de resum dividit llavors per a una llarga resum d'entrada. Our experiments demonstrate that Summ$^N$ outperforms previous state-of-the-art methods by improving ROUGE scores on three long meeting summarization datasets AMI, ICSI, and QMSum, two long TV series datasets from SummScreen, and a long document summarization dataset GovReport.  Les nostres dades i codis estan disponibles https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'fi': 'Tekstin yhteenveto auttaa lukijoita keräämään olennaista tietoa asiakirjoista, uutisista, haastatteluista ja kokouksista. Useimmat nykyaikaiset esikoulutetut kielimallit eivät kuitenkaan pysty käsittelemään pitkää tekstiä tehokkaasti monissa yhteenvetotehtävissä. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme Summ$^N$, yksinkertaista, joustavaa ja tehokasta monivaiheista kehystä syöttöteksteille, jotka ovat pidempiä kuin tyypillisten esikoulutettujen LM:ien maksimipituus. Summ$^N$ jakaa ensin tietonäytteet ja luo karkean yhteenvedon useissa vaiheissa ja tuottaa sitten lopullisen hienorakeisen yhteenvedon sen perusteella. Kehyksemme voi käsitellä mielivaltaisen pituista syöttötekstiä säätämällä vaiheiden määrää ja pitämällä LM-syötteen koko kiinteänä. Lisäksi se voi käsitellä sekä yhden lähdekoodin dokumentteja että dialogeja, ja sitä voidaan käyttää erilaisten selkärangan abstraktien yhteenvetomallien päälle. Tietojemme mukaan Summ$^N$ on ensimmäinen monivaiheinen split-then-summate kehys pitkän syötteen yhteenvetoon. Kokeemme osoittavat, että Summ$^N$ suoriutuu edellisistä huippuluokan menetelmistä parantamalla ROUGE-pisteitä kolmella pitkän kokouksen yhteenvetoaineistolla AMI, ICSI ja QMSum, kahdella pitkällä TV-sarjaaineistolla SummScreenilta ja pitkällä asiakirjayhteenvetoaineistolla GovReport. Tietomme ja koodimme ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'jv': 'Rasané Teks menyang bantuan kanggo kelas informasi sing nggawe suku dokumen, basa, resané, lan nganggo-nganggo. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive In this paper, we proposal Cum $N$first Split the data samples and Generes a corse sumulate in Multiple phases and after that manuses the last Fin-granted sumulate basate on it. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Tulung mbok nggawe bilgi, Cum $N$R iku, akeh multi-stadiun podho-podho-defo nggawe sistem kanggo langar sisan input sumulasi. Where am I Opo data lan kode sampeyan ing https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'ha': "Kurarin matsayi na taimakon readers su kãma information daga takardun takardar, news, gargaɗin da ake haɗa. A lokacin da, mafi yawan halin-sanar da aka yi sura misãlai na harshen (LM) ba su iya iya aikin matsayin tsawo mai fasahan wa aikin masu ƙari. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗar da buƙatan $^N$, wata firam mai sauƙi, mai lokaci da mai amfani da wajen matsayin ayuka masu nau'in-taraki masu tsawo da tsakanin tsakanin tsakanin da aka ƙayyade LM. Socket error code ConnectionTimeout Our framework can process input text of arbitrary length by adjusting the number of stages while keeping the LM input size fixed.  Za iya iya yi amfani da duk takardun takardun kwanan-ɗabi'a da zauren akwatin bayani, kuma za'a iya yi amfani da shi a kan saman misãlai masu ƙararin bakin bayani na daban-daban. Ga mafi kyaun saninmu, Summit$^N$na farkon jujjuya mai tsattsãfi-sa'an nan-ƙararin cikin ƙararin da aka ƙara. Mijarayonmu suka nuna cewa Summ$^N$ ya outperforms previous state-of-the-art metodes by improve scores of RUGE on three long meetin sumarization data set AMI, ICCI, and QM, 2 long TV sequences from Summscren, and a long document sumorization data set GovRat. QDialogButtonBox https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.", 'sk': 'Povzetek besedila pomaga bralcem zajeti pomembne informacije iz dokumentov, novic, intervjujev in sestankov. Vendar pa večina najsodobnejših predtreniranih jezikovnih modelov (LM) ne more učinkovito obdelati dolgega besedila za številna opravila povzetka. V tem prispevku predlagamo Summ$^N$, preprost, fleksibilen in učinkovit večstopenjski okvir za vhodna besedila, ki so daljša od največje dolžine konteksta tipičnih predtreniranih LM. Summ$^N$ najprej razdeli vzorce podatkov in ustvari grob povzetek v več fazah, nato pa na podlagi tega ustvari končni drobnozrnat povzetek. Naš okvir lahko obdeluje vhodno besedilo poljubne dolžine s prilagoditvijo števila stopenj, hkrati pa ohranja fiksno velikost vhoda LM. Poleg tega se lahko ukvarja z enovirnimi dokumenti in dialogi ter se lahko uporablja na vrhu različnih hrbteničnih abstraktivnih modelov povzetka. Po našem najboljšem znanju je Summ$^N$ prvi večstopenjski split-then-sumate okvir za dolgo povzetek vnosov. Naši eksperimenti dokazujejo, da Summ$^N$ presega prejšnje najsodobnejše metode z izboljšanjem ROUGE rezultatov na treh naborih podatkov za povzetek dolgih srečanj AMI, ICSI in QMSum, dveh dolgih naborih podatkov televizijskih serij iz SummScreena in dolgih naborih podatkov za povzetek dokumentov GovReport. Naši podatki in koda so na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'he': 'סדרת טקסט עוזרת לקוראים לתפוס מידע מפורסם ממסמכים, חדשות, ראיונות ופגישות. However, most state-of-the-art pretrained language models (LM) are unable to efficiently process long text for many summarization tasks.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים סם$^N$, מסגרת פשוטה, גמישה, ויפעילה במספר שלבים לטקסטים הכניסה שהם ארוכים יותר מאורך הקשר המקסימלי של LMs טיפוסיים מאוחר יותר. סם$^N$ קודם מחלק את דגימות הנתונים ויוצר סכם עצום במספר שלבים ואז מייצר את הסכם הסופי עם עגבנים על בסיסו. המסגרת שלנו יכולה לעבד טקסט הכניסה של אורך רציני על ידי שינוי מספר השלבים בזמן שמירה את גודל הכניסה LM תקין. חוץ מזה, הוא יכול להתמודד עם מסמכים מקור אחד ודיולוגים, ויכול להשתמש בו מעל מודלים שונים של סדרה אסטרקטיבית בעצם הגב. לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו, סם$^N$ הוא המסגרת הראשונה במספר שלבים חלקים-ואז-סכם לסומריזציה ארוכה של הכניסה. הניסויים שלנו מראים שסאם$^N$ מציג שיטות מוקדמות בעזרת שיפור נקודות ROUGE על שלושה קבוצות מידע מסכם של פגישות ארוכות AMI, ICSI, וקומסום, שני קבוצות מידע סדרות טלוויזיה ארוכות מ סאם סקרין, וקומסום מידע מסמכים ארוך GovReport. הנתונים והקוד שלנו זמינים ב https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.', 'bo': 'Text summarization helps readers capture salient information from documents, news, interviews, and meetings. ཡིན་ནའང་། state-of-the-art ས pretrained language models (LM)རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་བཅུད་སྡུད་དུས་ཡིག་རིང་པ་དེ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ། In this paper, we propose Summ$^N$, a simple, flexible and effective multi-stage framework for input texts that are longer than the maximum context length of typical pretrained LMs. .  Summ$^N$ first split the data samples and generates a coarse summary in multiple stages and then produces the final fine-grain summary based on it. Our framework can process input text of arbitrary length by adjusting the number of stages while keeping the LM input size fixed. Moreover, it can deal with both single-source documents and dialogues, and it can be used on top of different backbone abstractive summarization models. ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་Summ$^N$ ནི་མཐའ་མཚམས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་ཤོས་དང་བསྡུར་སྒྲུབ་རྩིས་བ་སྐྱེ Our experiments demonstrate that Summ$^N$ outperforms previous state-of-the-art methods by improving ROUGE scores on three long meeting summarization datasets AMI, ICSI, and QMSum, two long TV series datasets from SummScreen, and a long document summarization dataset GovReport. ང་ཚོའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་ཨང་རྟགས་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ https://github.com/psunlpgroup/Summ-N.'}
{'en': 'Language-Agnostic Meta-Learning for Low-Resource Text-to-Speech with Articulatory Features', 'es': 'Respuesta a preguntas de dominio abierto con una interfaz de conocimiento unificada', 'fr': 'Réponse aux questions de domaine ouvert avec une interface de connaissances unifiée', 'ar': 'افتح إجابة سؤال المجال بواجهة معرفة موحدة', 'ja': '統合されたナレッジインターフェイスを使用したオープンドメインの質問の回答', 'zh': '有一知识接口的开域问答', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы открытого домена с помощью унифицированного интерфейса знаний', 'pt': 'Resposta a perguntas de domínio aberto com uma interface de conhecimento unificada', 'hi': 'एक एकीकृत ज्ञान इंटरफ़ेस के साथ डोमेन प्रश्न उत्तर खोलें', 'ga': 'Freagra Ceist Fearainn Oscailte le Comhéadan Faisnéise Aontaithe', 'el': 'Απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις ανοιχτού τομέα με μια ενιαία διεπαφή γνώσης', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Nyitott tartományi kérdések megválaszolása egységes tudásfelülettel', 'it': "Risposta alle domande di dominio aperto con un'interfaccia unificata della conoscenza", 'mk': 'Отвори одговор на прашања на домен со унифициран интерфејс за знаење', 'kk': 'Домен сұрақтарын біріктірілген білім интерфейсімен жауап беру', 'lt': 'Atviras domeno klausimų atsakymas su vienoda žinių sąsaja', 'ms': 'Buka Jawapan soalan Domain dengan Antaramuka Pengetahuan Bersatu', 'mt': 'Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet f’Dominju Miftuħ b’Interfaċċja Unifikata tal-Għarfien', 'mn': 'Нэгдсэн мэдлэг интерфейстэй хариултыг Домен асуулт нээх', 'ml': 'ഒരു യൂണിഡെന്\u200dറ് അറിവ് ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസ്സുമായി ഡൊമെന്\u200d ചോദ്യം തുറക്കുക', 'no': 'Opna domenespørsmål svar med eit unisert kjennomsnitt', 'pl': 'Odpowiadanie na pytania otwarte w domenie za pomocą jednolitego interfejsu wiedzy', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări deschise de domeniu cu o interfață unificată de cunoștințe', 'sr': 'Otvoreno pitanje domena odgovara sa jedinstvenom znanstvenom interfejsom', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Svar på frågor om öppna domäner med ett enhetligt kunskapsgränssnitt', 'so': "Ka furan su'aalaha ku saabsan Interfaca aqoonta", 'ta': 'ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட அறிவிப்பு இடைமுகப்புடன் கேள்வியை திற', 'ur': 'ڈومین سوال کا جواب ایک واحد علم انٹرنیفس کے ساتھ کھول دے', 'vi': 'Mở câu hỏi miền với Giao thức có liên kết mật', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Besvarelse af spørgsmål om åbent domæne med en fælles vidensgrænseflade', 'bg': 'Отговаряне на въпроси с отворен домейн с унифициран интерфейс на знанието', 'hr': 'Otvorite pitanje domena odgovoriti na jedinstveno znanje', 'nl': 'Beantwoorden van open domeinvragen met een uniforme kennisinterface', 'id': 'Buka Pertanyaan Domain Jawaban dengan Interface Pengetahuan Unified', 'de': 'Beantwortung von offenen Fragen mit einer einheitlichen Wissensschnittstelle', 'fa': 'باز کردن سوال دامنه با یک مشترک دانش متحد', 'sw': 'Open Swali la Domain Answering with A Unified Knowledge Interface', 'ko': '통일된 지식 인터페이스를 가진 개방 영역 문답', 'tr': 'Bir Bilgi Arayüzü bilen jogap berişi A ç', 'sq': 'Hap përgjigjen e pyetjeve në domeni me një interfaqe të unifikuar të njohurive', 'af': "Open Domein Vrag Antwoord met 'n Eenvoudige kennis Koppelvlak", 'am': 'ዶሜን ክፈት', 'az': 'Bir Bilim Arayüzü ilə Domain sualını A ç', 'bn': 'একটি একত্রিত জ্ঞান ইন্টারফেস দিয়ে ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তর খোলো', 'hy': 'Բացել դաշտի հարցերի պատասխանը միավոր գիտելիքի ինտերֆեյսի միջոցով', 'bs': 'Otvori pitanje domena odgovarajući sa jedinstvenim znanstvenim interfejsom', 'ca': 'Open Domain Question Answering with A Unified Knowledge Interface', 'cs': 'Zodpovězení otázek s otevřenou doménou pomocí jednotného znalostního rozhraní', 'fi': 'Avoimen verkkotunnuksen kysymyksiin vastaaminen yhtenäisellä tietorajapinnalla', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamine ühtse teadmisliidesega', 'jv': 'Buka Kelangan Pangunian responsing karo A Unify Learn Markup', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'פתוח תשובה לשאלות Domain עם אינטרנט ידע מאוחד', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja z odprto domeno z enotnim vmesnikom znanja', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཁོངས་འདྲི་ཞིབ་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བ་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཤེས་པའི་ངོས་འདྲ་བ་ཅིག་དང་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བ'}
{'en': 'While neural text-to-speech systems perform remarkably well in high-resource scenarios, they cannot be applied to the majority of the over 6,000 spoken languages in the world due to a lack of appropriate training data. In this work, we use embeddings derived from articulatory vectors rather than embeddings derived from phoneme identities to learn phoneme representations that hold across languages. In conjunction with language agnostic meta learning, this enables us to fine-tune a high-quality text-to-speech model on just 30 minutes of data in a previously unseen language spoken by a previously unseen speaker.', 'ar': 'يعد إطار عمل قارئ المسترد شائعًا للإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح (ODQA) نظرًا لقدرته على استخدام المعرفة الصريحة.\nعلى الرغم من أن العمل السابق قد سعى إلى زيادة تغطية المعرفة من خلال دمج المعرفة المنظمة خارج النص ، إلا أن الوصول إلى مصادر المعرفة غير المتجانسة من خلال واجهة موحدة يظل سؤالًا مفتوحًا. في حين أن إنشاء البيانات إلى نص لديه القدرة على العمل كواجهة عالمية للبيانات والنصوص ، إلا أن جدواها في المهام النهائية لا تزال غير معروفة إلى حد كبير. في هذا العمل ، نقوم بسد هذه الفجوة واستخدام طريقة تحويل البيانات إلى نص كوسيلة لتشفير المعرفة المنظمة للإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح. على وجه التحديد ، نقترح إطار عمل للقارئ اللفظي - المسترد - لـ ODQA على البيانات والنص حيث يتم استخدام الجداول اللفظية من ويكيبيديا والرسوم البيانية من ويكي بيانات كمصادر معرفة معززة. نظهر أن البيانات الموحدة والنصوص الخاصة بنا ، UDT-QA ، يمكن أن تستفيد بشكل فعال من مؤشر المعرفة الموسع ، مما يؤدي إلى مكاسب كبيرة على خطوط الأساس النصية فقط. والجدير بالذكر أن نهجنا يضع النموذج الفردي للدولة من بين الفن في الأسئلة الطبيعية. علاوة على ذلك ، تشير تحليلاتنا إلى أن المعرفة اللفظية مفضلة لمنطق الإجابة لكل من الإعدادات المكيفة والمبادلة السريعة.', 'es': 'El marco de lectura y recuperación es popular para la respuesta a preguntas de dominio abierto (ODQA) debido a su capacidad para utilizar el conocimiento explícito.\nAunque el trabajo anterior ha tratado de aumentar la cobertura de conocimientos mediante la incorporación de conocimientos estructurados más allá del texto, el acceso a fuentes de conocimiento heterogéneas a través de una interfaz unificada sigue siendo una cuestión abierta. Si bien la generación de datos a texto tiene el potencial de servir como una interfaz universal para datos y texto, su viabilidad para las tareas posteriores sigue siendo en gran medida desconocida. En este trabajo, cerramos esta brecha y utilizamos el método de datos a texto como un medio para codificar el conocimiento estructurado para la respuesta a preguntas de dominio abierto. Específicamente, proponemos un marco de verbalizador-recuperador-lector para ODQA sobre datos y texto en el que las tablas verbalizadas de Wikipedia y los gráficos de Wikidata se utilizan como fuentes de conocimiento aumentadas. Demostramos que nuestro control de calidad de datos y texto unificado, UDT-QA, puede beneficiarse eficazmente del índice de conocimiento ampliado, lo que genera grandes ganancias con respecto a las líneas de base solo de texto. En particular, nuestro enfoque establece el modelo único de vanguardia en cuestiones naturales. Además, nuestros análisis indican que se prefiere el conocimiento verbalizado para el razonamiento de las respuestas tanto en entornos adaptados como de intercambio en caliente.', 'fr': "Le framework Retriever-Reader est populaire pour les réponses aux questions de domaine ouvert (ODQA) en raison de sa capacité à utiliser des connaissances explicites.\nBien que des travaux antérieurs aient cherché à accroître la couverture des connaissances en intégrant des connaissances structurées au-delà du texte, l'accès à des sources de connaissances hétérogènes via une interface unifiée reste une question ouverte. Alors que la génération de données en texte peut potentiellement servir d'interface universelle pour les données et le texte, sa faisabilité pour les tâches en aval reste largement inconnue. Dans ce travail, nous comblons cette lacune et utilisons la méthode données-texte comme moyen de coder des connaissances structurées pour répondre à des questions de domaine ouvert. Plus précisément, nous proposons un framework verbalizer-retriever reader pour l'ODQA sur les données et le texte où les tableaux verbalisés de Wikipédia et les graphiques de Wikidata sont utilisés comme sources de connaissances augmentées. Nous montrons que notre assurance qualité unifiée des données et des textes, UDT-QA, peut efficacement bénéficier de l'indice de connaissances élargi, ce qui entraîne des gains importants par rapport aux bases de référence texte uniquement. Notre approche définit notamment l'état de pointe du modèle unique en matière de questions naturelles. De plus, nos analyses indiquent que la connaissance verbale est préférable pour raisonner les réponses, à la fois pour les paramètres adaptés et remplaçables à chaud.", 'pt': 'O framework retriever-reader é popular para resposta a perguntas de domínio aberto (ODQA) devido à sua capacidade de usar conhecimento explícito.\nEmbora trabalhos anteriores tenham procurado aumentar a cobertura do conhecimento incorporando conhecimento estruturado além do texto, o acesso a fontes heterogêneas de conhecimento por meio de uma interface unificada permanece uma questão em aberto. Embora a geração de dados para texto tenha o potencial de servir como uma interface universal para dados e texto, sua viabilidade para tarefas de downstream permanece amplamente desconhecida. Neste trabalho, preenchemos essa lacuna e usamos o método data-to-text como um meio de codificação de conhecimento estruturado para resposta a perguntas de domínio aberto. Especificamente, propomos um framework de verbalizer-retriever-reader para ODQA sobre dados e texto onde tabelas verbalizadas da Wikipédia e gráficos da Wikidata são usados como fontes de conhecimento aumentadas. Mostramos que nosso QA Unificado de Dados e Texto, UDT-QA, pode se beneficiar efetivamente do índice de conhecimento expandido, levando a grandes ganhos sobre as linhas de base somente de texto. Notavelmente, nossa abordagem define o modelo único de última geração em Questões Naturais. Além disso, nossas análises indicam que o conhecimento verbalizado é preferido para o raciocínio de resposta para configurações adaptadas e hot-swap.', 'ja': 'リトリーバーリーダーフレームワークは、明示的な知識を使用することができるため、オープンドメインの質問応答（ ODQA ）に人気があります。\n以前の研究では、テキストを超えた構造化された知識を組み込むことによって知識のカバレッジを増やそうとしてきたが、統一されたインターフェースを介して異種の知識源にアクセスすることは、未解決の問題である。 データからテキストへの生成は、データとテキストのユニバーサルインターフェースとして機能する可能性がありますが、ダウンストリームタスクの実現可能性はほとんど知られていません。 この研究では、このギャップを埋め、オープンドメインの質問応答のための構造化された知識をエンコードする手段としてデータ対テキスト法を使用します。 具体的には、ウィキペディアからの言語化された表とウィキデータからのグラフが拡張された知識源として使用されるデータとテキストに対するODQAのための言語化-検索-読み取り-読み取りフレームワークを提案します。 当社のUnified Data and Text QA、UDT - QAは、拡張された知識インデックスから効果的に利益を得ることができ、テキストのみのベースラインよりも大きな利得につながることを示しています。 特に、私たちのアプローチは、自然問題に関する単一モデルの最先端を設定しています。 さらに、私たちの分析によると、言語化された知識は、適応された設定とホットスワップ設定の両方の回答推論に好ましいことが示されています。', 'zh': '检索器-阅读器框架问答开域(ODQA)中甚受欢迎,以其能用显式知也。\n虽前事图入文本之外结构化以广覆盖,而访问界面异构犹悬而未决也。 虽数至文本,或通用接口,其于下流可行性犹未可知也。 于此弥合,以数为编码开域问答之结构化。 具体来说有数本ODQA口搜索器-检索器-阅读器框架,维基百科口表维基图形以强知识。 吾明一数文本 QA(UDT-QA)可以益于广索引,而大有益于纯文本基线。 值得注意者,吾道设先进之一也。 此外分析表明,宜热插拔设,口头化者,理之首选也。', 'ru': 'Фреймворк Retriver-reader популярен для ответов на вопросы открытого домена (ODQA) из-за его способности использовать явные знания.\nХотя предыдущая работа была направлена на расширение сферы охвата знаний путем включения структурированных знаний за пределы текста, доступ к разнородным источникам знаний через унифицированный интерфейс остается открытым вопросом. В то время как генерация данных из одного текста в другой может служить универсальным интерфейсом для данных и текста, его осуществимость для последующих задач остается в значительной степени неизвестной. В этой работе мы устраняем этот пробел и используем метод data-to-text в качестве средства кодирования структурированных знаний для ответов на вопросы открытого домена. В частности, мы предлагаем фреймворк вербализатор-ретривер для ODQA над данными и текстом, где вербализованные таблицы из Википедии и графики из Викидата используются в качестве дополненных источников знаний. Мы показываем, что наш Unified Data and Text QA, UDT-QA, может эффективно извлекать выгоду из расширенного индекса знаний, что приводит к значительному выигрышу по сравнению с базовыми линиями только для текста. Примечательно, что наш подход устанавливает единую модель современного состояния по естественным вопросам. Кроме того, наши анализы показывают, что вербализованные знания предпочтительнее для аргументации ответов как для адаптированных, так и для настроек горячей замены.', 'hi': 'Retriever-Reader Framework खुले-डोमेन प्रश्न उत्तर (ODQA) के लिए लोकप्रिय है क्योंकि इसकी स्पष्ट ज्ञान का उपयोग करने की क्षमता है।\nयद्यपि पूर्व कार्य ने पाठ से परे संरचित ज्ञान को शामिल करके ज्ञान कवरेज को बढ़ाने की मांग की है, एक एकीकृत इंटरफ़ेस के माध्यम से विषम ज्ञान स्रोतों तक पहुंचना एक खुला सवाल बना हुआ है। जबकि डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट पीढ़ी में डेटा और टेक्स्ट के लिए एक सार्वभौमिक इंटरफ़ेस के रूप में सेवा करने की क्षमता है, डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए इसकी व्यवहार्यता काफी हद तक अज्ञात है। इस काम में, हम इस अंतर को पुल करते हैं और ओपन-डोमेन प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए संरचित ज्ञान को एन्कोडिंग करने के साधन के रूप में डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट विधि का उपयोग करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम डेटा और पाठ पर ODQA के लिए एक वर्बलाइज़र-रिट्रीवर-रीडर फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जहां विकिपीडिया से मौखिक तालिकाओं और विकिडेटा से ग्राफ़ का उपयोग संवर्धित ज्ञान स्रोतों के रूप में किया जाता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारे एकीकृत डेटा और पाठ क्यूए, यूडीटी-क्यूए, विस्तारित ज्ञान सूचकांक से प्रभावी ढंग से लाभान्वित हो सकते हैं, जिससे केवल पाठ बेसलाइन पर बड़े लाभ हो सकते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हमारा दृष्टिकोण प्राकृतिक प्रश्नों पर एकल-मॉडल अत्याधुनिक सेट करता है। इसके अलावा, हमारे विश्लेषण से संकेत मिलता है कि मौखिक ज्ञान को अनुकूलित और हॉट-स्वैप सेटिंग्स दोनों के लिए उत्तर तर्क के लिए पसंद किया जाता है।', 'ga': 'Tá an-tóir ar chreat an léitheora aisghabhála do fhreagraí ceisteanna fearainn oscailte (ODQA) mar gheall ar a chumas eolas follasach a úsáid.\nCé gur fhéach obair roimhe seo le clúdach an eolais a mhéadú trí eolas struchtúrtha a ionchorprú lasmuigh den téacs, is ceist oscailte fós í rochtain a fháil ar fhoinsí eolais ilchineálacha trí chomhéadan aontaithe. Cé go bhfuil an poitéinseal ag giniúint sonraí go téacs feidhmiú mar chomhéadan uilíoch do shonraí agus do théacs, ní fios go fóill a indéanta atá sé do thascanna iartheachtacha. San obair seo, déanaimid an bhearna seo a líonadh agus úsáidimid an modh sonraí-go-téacs mar mhodh chun eolas struchtúrtha a ionchódú le haghaidh freagraí fearann oscailte. Go sonrach, molaimid creat léitheoir-aisghabhálaí briathartha le haghaidh ODQA thar shonraí agus téacs ina n-úsáidtear táblaí briathartha ó Vicipéid agus graif ó Vicídata mar fhoinsí eolais méadaithe. Léirímid gur féidir lenár Sonraí Aontuithe agus QA Téacs, UDT-QA, leas éifeachtach a bhaint as an innéacs méadaithe eolais, as a dtiocfaidh gnóthachain mhóra thar bhunlínte téacs-amháin. Go sonrach, is é ár gcur chuige a leagann amach an tsamhail nua-aimseartha ar Cheisteanna Nádúrtha. Ina theannta sin, tugann ár n-anailís le fios gur fearr eolas briathartha chun réasúnaíocht a dhéanamh ar fhreagraí do shuíomhanna oiriúnaithe agus do shuímh babhtála te araon.', 'hu': 'A retriever-olvasó keretrendszer népszerű a nyílt domain kérdésválaszolásban (ODQA) a kifejezett ismeretek használatára való képessége miatt.', 'it': 'Il framework retriever-reader è popolare per la risposta alle domande a dominio aperto (ODQA) grazie alla sua capacità di utilizzare conoscenze esplicite.', 'kk': 'Алу- оқу бағдарламасы ашық доменге сұрақ (ODQA) жауап беру үшін қолданылады.', 'el': 'Το πλαίσιο ανάκτησης-ανάγνωσης είναι δημοφιλές για την απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις ανοικτού τομέα (ODQA) λόγω της δυνατότητάς του να χρησιμοποιεί ρητή γνώση.', 'ka': 'მოკითხველი საკითხველი ფრამეტრი პოლიპურია საკითხვისთვის (ODQA) საკითხვისთვის მისი შესაძლებლობა გამოიყენოთ განსხვავებული ცოცხლება.', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į savo gebėjimą naudotis aiškiomis žiniomis, atviros srities klausimų atsakymo sistema yra populiari.', 'mk': 'Рамката за читање на резервер е популарна за одговори на отворени прашања (ODQA) поради нејзината способност да користи експлицитно знаење.', 'mt': 'Il-qafas tal-qarrejja-riċevitur huwa popolari għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet b’dominju miftuħ (ODQA) minħabba l-kapaċità tiegħu li juża għarfien espliċitu.', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തമായ അറിവ് ഉപയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള ശക്തിയാല്\u200d തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനായി വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്ന വായിക', 'pl': 'Framework retriever-reader jest popularny w otwartych domenach odpowiedzi na pytania (ODQA) ze względu na swoją zdolność do wykorzystania jasnej wiedzy.', 'mn': 'Шинэ мэдлэг ашиглах боломжтой болохоор хүлээн авагчийн уншигчийн систем нь нээлттэй холбоотой асуулт (ODQA) хариултын тулд алдартай.', 'no': 'Rammeverket for retriever-lesar er populært for oppgjevne domenespørsmål (ODQA) på grunn av at han kan bruka eksplisitt kunnskap.', 'ro': 'Cadrul retriever-reader este popular pentru răspunsul la întrebări pe domeniu deschis (ODQA) datorită capacității sale de a utiliza cunoștințe explicite.', 'sr': 'Okvir za pročitanje otvorenog domena je popularan zbog odgovora na pitanje otvorenog domena (ODQA) zbog sposobnosti koristiti jasno znanje.', 'si': 'පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න (ODQA) සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප', 'sv': 'Ramverket retriever-reader är populärt för open-domain frågesvar (ODQA) på grund av dess förmåga att använda explicit kunskap.', 'so': "Qoraalka qofka dib u soo celinaya waa u maarmaan in uu ka jawaabo su'aalaha furan ee gudaha (ODQA) sababtoo ah awooddiisa uu isticmaalo aqoonta cad.", 'ms': 'kerangka pembaca-pemulih adalah populer untuk menjawab soalan domain terbuka (ODQA) kerana kemampuannya untuk menggunakan pengetahuan eksplisit.', 'ta': 'வெளிப்படையான அறிவிப்பை பயன்படுத்துவதற்காக திறந்த டொமைன் கேள்வி பதில் (ODQA) மீண்டும் பெறுநர்- படிப்பான சட்டம் பிரபலம', 'ur': 'پھیرنے والی پڑھنے والی فرمیک کھولنے والی ڈومین سؤال کے جواب (ODQA) کے لئے محبوب ہے اس کی کھلی علم کے استعمال کرنے کی طاقت کے سبب۔', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phần cấu trúc về người đọc được phổ biến cho câu hỏi mở miền (OQA) do khả năng sử dụng kiến thức rõ ràng của nó.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa wasomaji wa kurejesha ni maarufu wa kujibu swali la wazi la ndani (ODQA) kwa sababu ya uwezo wake wa kutumia maarifa ya wazi. Ingawa kazi ya kabla imejaribu kuongeza taarifa za maarifa kwa kuingiza maarifa yaliyotengenezwa zaidi ya ujuzi wa maandishi, kuingilia vyanzo vya maarifa vinavyotengenezwa kupitia mtandao wa pamoja bado ni swali la wazi. Wakati kizazi cha data-to-text kina uwezekano wa kutumika kama sura ya kimataifa kwa taarifa na maandishi, uwezekano wake wa kazi za chini bado haujulikani sana. Katika kazi hii, tunatengeneza upepo huu na tunatumia njia za taarifa hadi ujumbe wa simu kama njia ya kuingiza maarifa iliyoanzishwa kwa ajili ya kujibu swali la wazi la ndani. Kwa ujumla, tunapendekeza mfumo wa wasomaji wa mtandao wa intaneti wa ODQA kwa ajili ya taarifa na ujumbe ambapo meza zilizotengenezwa kutoka Wikipedia na picha kutoka Wikidata zinatumiwa kama vyanzo vya ujuzi vilivyoongezeka. Tunaonyesha kuwa taarifa zetu za Umoja na Makala ya Mataifa, UDT-QA, inaweza kufaidika kwa ufanisi kutoka kwa index ya maarifa inayoongezeka, na kusababisha mafanikio makubwa zaidi ya misingi yenye ujumbe pekee. Notably, our approach sets the single-model state-of-the-art on Natural Questions.  Zaidi ya hayo, uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kuwa maarifa yaliyotengenezwa ni bora ya kujibu kwa sababu ya mazingira yanayobadilishwa na mabadiliko ya moto.', 'id': 'Bingkai pembaca-retriever populer untuk menjawab pertanyaan domain terbuka (ODQA) karena kemampuannya untuk menggunakan pengetahuan eksplisit. Although prior work has sought to increase the knowledge coverage by incorporating structured knowledge beyond text, accessing heterogeneous knowledge sources through a unified interface remains an open question.  Sementara generasi data-ke-teks memiliki potensi untuk melayani sebagai antaramuka universal untuk data dan teks, kemudahan untuk tugas turun tetap kebanyakan tidak diketahui. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita memecahkan ruang ini dan menggunakan metode data-ke-teks sebagai cara untuk mengkode pengetahuan struktur untuk menjawab pertanyaan domain terbuka. Secara spesifik, kami mengusulkan rangkaian pembaca-pembaca-verbalisasi untuk ODQA melalui data dan teks di mana meja-meja verbalisasi dari Wikipedia dan grafik dari Wikidata digunakan sebagai sumber pengetahuan tambahan. Kami menunjukkan bahwa Data dan Teks Unified QA, UDT-QA, dapat berguna dari indeks pengetahuan yang diperbesar, yang menyebabkan keuntungan besar atas garis dasar hanya teks. Notably, our approach sets the single-model state-of-the-art on Natural Questions.  Selain itu, analisis kami menunjukkan bahwa pengetahuan verbal lebih memilih untuk alasan jawaban untuk kedua pengaturan adaptasi dan pertukaran panas.', 'tr': 'Alykçy-okayş çerçevesi açık-domenyň soragy (ODQA) üçin popüler. Öň işden öňki bilgi gabatyny tekstden daşary strukturly bilgi daşarylýan hem bolsa-de, bir interfejs bilen öňki bilim kanlaryny ýerleşdirmek üçin a çyk soragy ýok. data-to-text döredişi maglumaty we metin üçin uniwersal bir interfejs hökmünde bolup biljek bolmagy mümkinçiligi bar, taýýarlan täzelikleri üçin edip biljek bolup bilmeýär. Bu işde, biz bu boşlukları köprüp, verilere metin yöntemini a çmak için yapılan bilgi kodlamak için kullanırız. Adatça, biz ODQA üçin bir verbalizer-maňlatçy-maňlatçy çerçewçiliki, maglumat we metin üstünde wirkalişdirilýän täblikler we wikipediýanyň grafiklerinden gelişmiş bilim çeşmeleri hökmünde ullanylýar. Biz Birleşik Maglumatlarymyz we Metin QA, UDT-QA-nyň, genişlenen bilgi indeksesiniň ullanyşyny görkezip bileris, diňe metin basa hatlaryň üstünden uly gazançlyga ýok edip bileris. Mümkin däl bolsa, biziň ýaryşymyz tebigy soraglarda bir nusga ýagdaýyny gurlaýar. Munuň üçin, analyzlarymyz verbalized bilgi hem üýtgedilen hem süýtgeli we süýtgeli düzümlerniň jogabaty üçin tercih edilýändigini görkezýär.', 'da': 'Retriever-reader framework er populær til open-domain spørgsmål besvarelse (ODQA) på grund af dens evne til at bruge eksplicit viden. Selv om tidligere arbejde har forsøgt at øge vidensdækningen ved at indarbejde struktureret viden ud over tekst, er adgang til heterogene videnkilder via en samlet grænseflade stadig et åbent spørgsmål. Selv om data-til-tekst-generering har potentiale til at fungere som en universel grænseflade for data og tekst, er dens gennemførlighed for downstream-opgaver stadig stort set ukendt. I dette arbejde bygger vi bro over dette hul og bruger data-to-text metoden som et middel til at kode struktureret viden til open-domain spørgsmål besvarelse. Specielt foreslår vi en verbaliser-retriever-læser ramme for ODQA over data og tekst, hvor verbaliserede tabeller fra Wikipedia og grafer fra Wikidata bruges som forstærkede videnskabelige kilder. Vi viser, at vores Unified Data and Text QA, UDT-QA, effektivt kan drage fordel af det udvidede vidensindeks, hvilket fører til store gevinster i forhold til tekstbaserede basislinjer. Især sætter vores tilgang den enkelte model state-of-the-art på naturlige spørgsmål. Desuden tyder vores analyser på, at verbaliseret viden foretrækkes til svar ræsonnement for både tilpassede og hot-swap indstillinger.', 'am': 'አዲስ-አናባቢው ፍሬም ግልፅ እውቀትን ለመጠቀም ስልጣን የተደረገ የዶሜን ጥያቄ መልስ (ODQA) ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን አስቀድሞ ሥራው እውቀትን ለማድረግ እውቀትን ከጽሑፍ በላይ በማሰናከል ለመጨመር ይፈልጋል፣ በተለያዩ የእውቀትን ምንጮች በመግኘት ግን የተከፈተ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ ዳታ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ ትውልድ ለዳታ እና ጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ ማገልገል የሚችል ስልጣን ቢኖር፣ የዳታ-ወደ-text ትውልድ ለዳታ እና የጽሑፍ ማቀናኘት ስልጣኑ ግን አብዛኛውን አያውቅም፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ላይ ይህን ክፍል እናስቀድዳለን የዳታ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ ሥርዓት እውቀትን ለክፍት ዶሜን ጥያቄን ለመቀበል ማቀናጃ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የODQA ዳታ እና ጽሑፍ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ገበታዎች ከWikipedia እና Wikidata ያሉት ቀለሞች እንደ ተጨማሪው እውቀት ምንጭ ይጠቀማሉ፡፡ የአሁኑን ዳታ እና የጽሑፍ QA፣ UDT-QA፣ ከተሰፋው እውቀት ማውቀት index የሚጠቅመውን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የእኛ ልግስና የአንዲት ብሔራዊ የዓለሙን ጥያቄ ላይ ያቆማል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ማስታወቂያችን የተመሳሳይ እውቀት ለመቀበል እና ለሙቀት ማቀናቀል ማሰናከል ይሻላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Korniza e lexuesit-ripërmarrës është popullore për përgjigjen e pyetjeve në domeni të hapur (ODQA) për shkak të aftësisë së saj për të përdorur njohuri të qartë. Ndonse puna e mëparshme ka kërkuar të rritë mbulimin e njohurive duke përfshirë njohuritë e strukturuara përtej tekstit, aksesi i burimeve heterogjene të njohurive nëpërmjet një interfaqe të unifikuar mbetet një pyetje e hapur. Ndërsa gjenerimi i të dhënave në tekst ka potencialin për të shërbyer si një interfaqe universale për të dhënat dhe tekstin, realizueshmëria e tij për detyrat poshtë vazhdimisht mbetet e panjohur. Në këtë punë, ne e mbulojmë këtë boshllëk dhe përdorim metodën e të dhënave në tekst si një mjet për kodimin e njohurive të strukturuara për përgjigjen e pyetjeve në domeni të hapur. Në mënyrë specifike, ne propozojmë një kuadër verbalizues-marrës-lexues për ODQA mbi të dhënat dhe tekstin ku tabelat verbalizuar nga Wikipedia dhe grafikët nga Wikidata përdoren si burime të rritura të njohurive. We show that our Unified Data and Text QA, UDT-QA, can effectively benefit from the expanded knowledge index, leading to large gains over text-only baselines.  Në mënyrë të veçantë, qasja jonë vendos një model më të mirë në çështjet natyrore. Përveç kësaj, analizat tona tregojnë se njohuria verbale është e preferuar për arsyetimin e përgjigjeve si për rregullimet e adaptuara ashtu edhe për ndërrimin e nxehtë.', 'nl': 'Het retriever-reader framework is populair voor open-domein vragen beantwoorden (ODQA) vanwege de mogelijkheid om expliciete kennis te gebruiken. Hoewel eerdere werkzaamheden hebben geprobeerd om de kennisdekking te vergroten door gestructureerde kennis buiten tekst op te nemen, blijft toegang tot heterogene kennisbronnen via een uniforme interface een open vraag. Hoewel data-to-text generatie het potentieel heeft om te dienen als een universele interface voor data en tekst, is de haalbaarheid ervan voor downstreamtaken grotendeels onbekend. In dit werk overbruggen we deze kloof en gebruiken we de data-to-text methode als middel om gestructureerde kennis te coderen voor open-domein vragenantwoorden. Specifiek stellen we een verbalizer-retriever-reader framework voor ODQA over gegevens en tekst voor waarbij verbaliseerde tabellen uit Wikipedia en grafieken uit Wikidata worden gebruikt als uitgebreide kennisbronnen. We laten zien dat onze Unified Data and Text QA, UDT-QA, effectief kan profiteren van de uitgebreide kennisindex, wat leidt tot grote winsten ten opzichte van alleen tekst baselines. Met name onze aanpak zet de single-model state-of-the-art op Natural Questions. Verder geven onze analyses aan dat verbale kennis de voorkeur heeft voor antwoordredenering voor zowel aangepaste als hot-swap instellingen.', 'ko': 'retriever reader 프레임워크는 현식 지식을 사용하는 능력 때문에 개방역 퀴즈(ODQA)에서 인기가 많다.비록 이전의 작업은 텍스트 이외의 구조화된 지식을 통합시켜 지식의 범위를 높이려고 시도했지만, 통일된 인터페이스를 통해 이구 지식원에 접근하는 것은 여전히 현안으로 남아 있다.데이터와 텍스트의 생성은 데이터와 텍스트의 통용 인터페이스가 될 수 있지만, 하위 작업에서의 타당성은 어느 정도 알 수 없다.이 작업에서 우리는 이 격차를 메우고 데이터를 텍스트로 인코딩하는 방법을 개방된 분야의 문답 구조화 지식을 인코딩하는 방법으로 사용했다.구체적으로 말하면 데이터와 텍스트를 바탕으로 하는 ODQA 언어 검색기 리더 프레임워크를 제시했는데 그 중에서 위키백과에서 온 언어화 테이블과 위키데이터에서 온 도형이 강화된 지식원으로 사용된다.우리는 우리의 통일된 데이터와 텍스트 QA UDT-QA가 확장된 지식 인덱스에서 효과적으로 이익을 얻고 순수한 텍스트 기선보다 더 큰 이익을 얻을 수 있음을 나타낸다.주의해야 할 것은 우리의 방법은 자연 문제를 위해 가장 선진적인 단일 모델을 설정한 것이다.그 밖에 우리의 분석에 의하면 적응과 핫플러그 설정에 대해 구두지식은 첫 번째 답안 추리이다.', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তর (ওডিকিউএ) কারণে পুনরুদ্ধার-পাঠক ফ্রেমে জনপ্রিয়। যদিও পূর্ববর্তী কাজের চেষ্টা করেছে একটি একত্রিত ইন্টারফেসের মাধ্যমে জ্ঞানের স্থাপন করা জ্ঞানের বাইরে যোগাযোগ করার মাধ্যমে জ্ঞানের তথ্য থেকে টেক্সট প্রজন্মের সাথে তথ্য এবং টেক্সটের জন্য বিশ্ববিদ্যুত ইন্টারফেস হিসেবে সাহায্য করার সম্ভাবনা আছে, তবে নীচ এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা এই বিভ্রান্তি ব্রিজ করি এবং তথ্য থেকে টেক্সট পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি খোলা ডোমেইন প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য কাঠামো জ্ঞ বিশেষ করে, আমরা ওডিকিউএ ডাটা এবং টেক্সটের উপর একটি ভার্বালিজার-পাঠক ফ্রেম প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে উইকিপিডিয়া থেকে ভার্বালেজার টেবিল এবং উইকিডার থেকে ভার আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের একত্রিত তথ্য এবং টেক্সট কিউ, ইউডিটি-কিউএ, বিস্তৃত জ্ঞানের সূচি থেকে কার্যকর কাজে লাভ করতে পারে, যার ফলে টে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে একটি মডেলের অবস্থা নির্ধারণ করে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ নির্দেশ দেয়া হয়েছে যে ভার্বালেজের জ্ঞানের উত্তরের জন্য উত্তর প্রার্থনা করা হয়েছে এবং উষ্ণ-', 'de': 'Das Retriever-Reader Framework ist aufgrund seiner Fähigkeit, explizites Wissen zu nutzen, für Open-Domain Question Responsing (ODQA) beliebt. Obwohl in früheren Arbeiten versucht wurde, die Wissensabdeckung durch Einbeziehung von strukturiertem Wissen jenseits von Text zu erhöhen, bleibt der Zugriff auf heterogene Wissensquellen über eine einheitliche Schnittstelle eine offene Frage. Während die Daten-zu-Text-Generierung das Potenzial hat, als universelle Schnittstelle für Daten und Text zu dienen, ist ihre Durchführbarkeit für nachgelagerte Aufgaben weitgehend unbekannt. In dieser Arbeit schließen wir diese Lücke und nutzen die Daten-zu-Text-Methode als Mittel zur Codierung strukturierten Wissens für offene Fragestellungen. Insbesondere schlagen wir ein verbalizer-retriever-reader Framework für ODQA über Daten und Text vor, bei dem verbalisierte Tabellen aus Wikipedia und Graphen aus Wikidata als erweiterte Wissensquellen verwendet werden. Wir zeigen, dass unsere Unified Data and Text QA, UDT-QA, effektiv vom erweiterten Wissensindex profitieren kann, was zu großen Gewinnen gegenüber reinen Textbaselines führt. Besonders hervorzuheben ist, dass unser Ansatz den Single-Model-State-of-the-Art zu Natural Questions setzt. Darüber hinaus zeigen unsere Analysen, dass verbales Wissen sowohl für angepasste als auch für Hot-Swap-Einstellungen bevorzugt wird.', 'bg': 'Рамката за ретривър-четец е популярна за отговор на въпроси с отворен домейн поради способността си да използва изрични знания. Въпреки че предишната работа се стреми да увеличи обхвата на знанията чрез включване на структурирани знания извън текста, достъпът до хетерогенни източници на знания чрез единен интерфейс остава отворен въпрос. Докато генерирането на данни към текст има потенциала да служи като универсален интерфейс за данни и текст, неговата осъществимост за задачи надолу по веригата остава до голяма степен неизвестна. В тази работа преодоляваме тази празнота и използваме метода данни към текст като средство за кодиране на структурирани знания за отворен домейн отговор на въпроси. По-конкретно, ние предлагаме рамка за вербализатор-ретривър-читател за данни и текст, където вербализирани таблици от Уикипедия и графики от Уикиданни се използват като източници на разширено знание. Показваме, че нашият унифициран достъп до данни и текст, може ефективно да се възползва от разширения индекс на знанието, което води до големи печалби спрямо базовите линии само за текст. По-специално, нашият подход поставя един модел на най-съвременните технологии по природните въпроси. Освен това нашите анализи показват, че вербализираното знание е предпочитано за мотивиране на отговорите както за адаптираните, така и за горещите настройки.', 'fa': 'چهارچوب خواننده\u200cی بازیابی برای جواب سوال دامنی باز (ODQA) به دلیل توانایی استفاده از دانش مشخص محبوب است. اگرچه کار پیش از این تلاش کرده است که پوشش علمی را افزایش دهد با شامل دانش ساخته\u200cشده فراتر از متن، به منابع دانش\u200cهای متفاوتی از طریق یک ارتباط متحد یک سوال باز است. در حالی که نسل داده\u200cها به متن توانایی برای خدمت به عنوان یک ارتباط جهانی برای داده\u200cها و متن دارد، قابلیت آن برای کار\u200cهای پایین\u200cترین\u200cترین\u200cها بسیار ناشناخته است. در این کار، ما این فاصله را برابر می کنیم و از طریق داده به متن به عنوان وسیله برای رمزبندی علم ساخته شده برای جواب سوال دامنه باز استفاده می کنیم. مخصوصاً ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار ما نشان می دهیم که داده های متحد و متن ما QA، UDT-QA، می توانند به طور تاثیر از نسخه علم گسترش سود دهند، که به سود فراوانی بزرگ بر خطوط\u200cهای پایین فقط متن می\u200cرسد. معلومه که دستور ما یک مدل هنر را بر سوالات طبیعی قرار می دهد. علاوه بر این، تحلیل\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که دانش\u200cهای ویژه\u200cسازی برای پاسخ\u200cگیری برای تنظیم\u200cهای تغییر\u200cسازی و گرم ترجیح داده می\u200cشود.', 'bs': 'Okvir za pročitanje otvorenog domena je popularan zbog odgovora na pitanje otvorenog domena (ODQA) zbog sposobnosti koristiti jasno znanje. Iako je prije posla pokušao povećati pokrivanje znanja uključujući strukturirano znanje izvan teksta, pristup heterogenenim izvorima znanja putem ujedinjenog interfejsa ostaje otvoreno pitanje. Iako generacija podataka do teksta ima potencijal da služi kao univerzalni interfejs podataka i teksta, njegova mogućnost za spuštanje zadataka ostaje u velikoj mjeri nepoznata. U ovom poslu, mi predstavljamo ovu prazninu i koristimo metodu podataka na tekst kao sredstvo za kodiranje strukturiranih znanja za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena. Posebno, predlažemo okvir za pročitač verbalizer a za ODQA preko podataka i teksta gdje se verbalizirani stolovi iz Wikipedije i grafika iz Wikipodataka koriste kao povećani izvori znanja. Pokazujemo da naši ujedinjeni podaci i tekst QA, UDT-QA, mogu učinkovito koristiti od proširenog indeksa znanja, koji vodi do velikih dobića iznad samo tekstske osnovne linije. Naravno, naš pristup postavlja jedinstveno modelo stanje umjetnosti na prirodnim pitanjima. Nadalje, naši analizi ukazuju na to da je verbalizirano znanje preferirano za odgovorne razloge za prilagođene i vruće mijenjanje.', 'hr': 'Okvir pročitača otvorenog domena je popularan zbog odgovora na pitanje otvorenog domena (ODQA) zbog sposobnosti koristiti jasno znanje. Iako je prije posla pokušao povećati pokrivanje znanja uključujući strukturirano znanje izvan teksta, pristup heterogenenim izvorima znanja putem ujedinjenog interfejsa ostaje otvoreno pitanje. Iako generacija podataka do teksta ima mogućnost služiti kao univerzalni interfejs podataka i teksta, njegova mogućnost za snižene zadatke i dalje je u velikoj mjeri nepoznata. U ovom poslu, mi predstavljamo taj praznik i koristimo metodu podataka na tekst kao sredstvo za kodiranje strukturiranih znanja za odgovor na pitanje otvorenog domena. Posebno, predlažemo okvir pročitača verbalizatora za ODQA preko podataka i teksta gdje se verbalizirani stolovi iz Wikipedije i grafika iz Wikipodataka koriste kao povećani izvori znanja. Pokazujemo da naši ujedinjeni podaci i tekst QA, UDT-QA, mogu učinkovito koristiti od proširenog indeksa znanja, koji vodi do velikih dobića iznad samo teksta. Naravno, naš pristup postavlja jedinstveno modelo stanje umjetnosti na prirodnim pitanjima. Nadalje, naši analizi ukazuju na to da je verbalizirano znanje preferirano za odgovorne razloge za prilagođene i vruće zamjene nastave.', 'hy': 'Վերադարձ-կարդացողի շրջանակը հայտնի է բաց բնագավառի հարցերի պատասխանելու համար, քանի որ այն ունի օգտագործել բացահայտ գիտելիքներ: Չնայած նախորդ աշխատանքը փորձել է բարձրացնել գիտելիքների ծածկումը, ներառելով տեքստից դուրս կառուցված գիտելիքներ, միևնույն է բաց հարց է մնում հնարավոր հնարավորություն ունենալ հերոգենյա գիտելիքների աղբյու Մինչդեռ տվյալների տեքստի միջև ստեղծման պոտենցիալը ունի օգտագործելու որպես համաշխարհային ինտերֆեյս տվյալների և տեքստի համար, դրա իրականացման հնարավորությունը դեռևս մեծ մասամբ անհայտ է: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք վերացնում ենք այս տարբերությունը և օգտագործում ենք տվյալներ տեքստի մեթոդը որպես միջոց կառուցվածքավորված գիտելիքների կոդավորման համար բաց բնագավառի հարցերի պատասխանելու համար: Հատկապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք ՕԴՔԱ-ի բերբալիզացիչ-վերադարձ-կարդացող շրջանակ տվյալների և տեքստի վերաբերյալ, որտեղ Վիքիփեդիայի բերբալիզացված աղյուսակները և Վիքիդատայի գրաֆիկները օգտագործվում են որպես աճված գիտելիքների աղ Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր միավոր տվյալները և տեքստը QA-ը, UDT-QA-ը, կարող են արդյունավետ շահույթ ունենալ ընդլայնված գիտելիքների ինդեքսից, ինչը հանգեցնում է մեծ շահույթ միայն տեքստի հիմքերում: Notably, our approach sets the single-model state-of-the-art on Natural Questions.  Ավելին, մեր վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ բերբալիզացված գիտելիքները նախընտրում են պատասխանների մտածելու համար՝ ինչպես հարմարեցված, ինչպես նաև տաք փոխանակում տեղեկատվության համար:', 'af': "Die ontvanger-leser raamwerk is populaar vir open-domein vraag antwoord (ODQA) vanweë sy moontlikheid om uitduidelike kennis te gebruik. Alhoewel vooraf werk het gesoek om die kennisdekking te vermeerder deur struktureerde kennis buite teks te inkorporeer, toegang van onheilige kennisbronne deur 'n eenheilige koppelvlak bly 'n oop vraag. Terwyl data- to- text generasie het die potensieal om as 'n universele koppelvlak vir data en teks te dien, bly sy feilikheid vir onderstreem opdragte groot onbekende. In hierdie werk, gebruik ons hierdie gap en gebruik die data- to- text metode as 'n beteken vir enkodering structureerde kennis vir open- domain vraag antwoord. Spesifieke, ons voorstel 'n verbaliseerder-ontvanger-leser-raamwerk vir ODQA oor data en teks waar verbaliseerde tabelle van Wikipedia en grafieke van Wikidata gebruik word as vergroot kennis bronne. Ons wys dat ons Unified Data en Teks QA, UDT-QA, effektief kan voordeel van die uitgebreide kennis indeks, wat lei na groot verskaffings oor teks alleen baselyn. Notief, ons toegang stel die enkel-model state-of-the-art op Natuurlike Vragate. Ons analiserings wys ook dat verbaliseerde kennis voorkeur is vir antwoord redering vir beide aanpasde en warm-swap instellings.", 'et': 'Otsija-lugeja raamistik on populaarne avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamiseks (ODQA) tänu oma võimele kasutada selgesõnalisi teadmisi. Kuigi varasemate töödega on püütud suurendada teadmiste katvust struktureeritud teadmiste lisamise kaudu, jääb lahtiseks küsimuseks juurdepääs heterogeensetele teadmiste allikatele ühtse liidese kaudu. Kuigi andmete ja teksti vaheline genereerimine võib olla andmete ja teksti universaalne liides, on selle teostatavus järgmise etapi ülesannete täitmiseks suures osas teadmata. Käesolevas töös ületame selle lõhe ja kasutame andmete-teksti meetodit kui vahendit struktureeritud teadmiste kodeerimiseks avatud domeeni küsimustele vastamiseks. Täpsemalt pakume välja ODQA-le sõnalised andmed ja tekstid, kus Vikipeedia sõnalised tabelid ja Wikidata graafikud kasutatakse täiendatud teadmiste allikatena. Näitame, et meie ühendatud andmete ja teksti kvaliteedi tagamine (UDT-QA) võib tõhusalt kasu saada laiendatud teadmisteindeksist, mis toob kaasa suure kasu ainult tekstipõhistest lähtejoontest. Eelkõige seab meie lähenemisviis loodusküsimuste ühe mudeli state-of-the-art. Lisaks sellele näitavad meie analüüsid, et nii kohandatud kui ka hot-swap seadetes eelistatakse suulisi teadmisi.', 'fi': 'Hakija-lukijakehys on suosittu avoimen verkkotunnuksen kysymysvastauksessa (ODQA), koska se pystyy käyttämään eksplisiittistä tietoa. Vaikka aiemmissa tutkimuksissa on pyritty lisäämään tietämyksen kattavuutta sisällyttämällä strukturoitua tietoa tekstin ulkopuolelle, heterogeenisten tietolähteiden käyttö yhtenäisen käyttöliittymän kautta on edelleen avoin kysymys. Vaikka datan ja tekstin välinen generointi voi toimia yleisenä käyttöliittymänä datalle ja tekstille, sen soveltuvuutta jatkojalostustehtäviin ei tunneta. Tässä työssä kurotamme tämän kuilun umpeen ja käytämme data-to-text-menetelmää keinona koodata strukturoitua tietoa avoimeen kysymykseen vastaamiseen. Erityisesti ehdotamme ODQA:n sanalyysi-noutaja-lukijakehystä datan ja tekstin päälle, jossa Wikipedian sanalyysiä taulukoita ja Wikidatan kaavioita käytetään laajennettuina tietolähteinä. Osoitamme, että Unified Data and Text QA, UDT-QA, voi tehokkaasti hyötyä laajennetusta tietoindeksistä, mikä johtaa suuriin voittoihin verrattuna vain tekstiä sisältäviin perusviivoihin. Erityisesti lähestymistapamme asettaa yhden mallin state-of-the-art Natural Questions. Analyysimme osoittavat lisäksi, että suullinen tieto on suositeltavaa vastauspäättelyssä sekä mukautettujen että hot swap -asetusten osalta.', 'az': 'Yaxşı bilgi istifadə etmək bacarığına görə alıcı-oxuyucu qurğusu açıq-domani sual cavab vermək üçün məşhurdur. Əvvəlki işdə elm örtüyünü artırmaq istəsə də, tekstdən başqa strukturlu elm daxil etmək istəyirdi, birlikdə bir interfejs vasitəsilə müxtəlif elm kaynaqlarına istifadə etmək a çıq bir sual idi. Data-to-text nəzəriyyəti məlumatlar və məlumatlar üçün universal interfejs olaraq istifadə etmək mümkün olmasına rağmen, a şağı göndərilən işlər üçün mümkün olması çox bilinmədir. Bu işdə, biz bu boşluğu köçürüb, verilən-mətn metodlarını a çıq-domain sualına cavab vermək üçün kodlama qurulmuş bilgi üçün istifadə edirik. Özellikle, biz ODQA verilənlərin və metinlərin üstündə vörbalizatçı-alıcı-oxuyan framework ü təklif edirik ki, Wikipedia və Wikidata grafələrindən verbalized tables are used as an increased knowledge sources. Biz birləşdirilmiş məlumat və məlumat QA, UDT-QA, genişlənmiş bilgi indeksindən fayda verə biləcəyini göstəririk, məlumat yalnız temel səhifələrindən böyük qələbə yetirə bilər. Əlbəttə, bizim tərəfimiz təkcə modeli təbiətli suallar barəsində təbiətli mövzuları təyin edir. Daha sonra, analizlərimiz verbalized bilgi həmçinin uyğunlaşdırılmış və sıcak dəyişiklik ayarları üçün cavab vermək üçün seçildiyini göstərir.', 'cs': 'Rámec retriever-reader je populární pro odpovědi na otázky otevřené domény (ODQA) díky své schopnosti využívat explicitní znalosti. Přestože se předchozí práce snažila zvýšit pokrytí znalostí začleněním strukturovaných znalostí mimo text, přístup k heterogenním zdrojům znalostí prostřednictvím jednotného rozhraní zůstává otevřenou otázkou. Zatímco generování dat na text má potenciál sloužit jako univerzální rozhraní pro data a text, jeho proveditelnost pro následné úkoly zůstává značně neznámá. V této práci tuto mezeru překlenujeme a používáme metodu data-to-text jako prostředek pro kódování strukturovaných znalostí pro zodpovězení otázek v otevřené doméně. Konkrétně navrhujeme verbalizer-retriever-reader framework pro ODQA nad daty a textem, kde slouží verbalizované tabulky z Wikipedie a grafy z Wikidat jako rozšířené zdroje znalostí. Ukazujeme, že naše Unified Data and Text QA, UDT-QA, může efektivně těžit z rozšířeného indexu znalostí, což vede k velkým ziskům oproti textovým základním liniím. Především náš přístup stanovuje jednomólový state-of-the-art pro přírodní otázky. Dále naše analýzy ukazují, že slovní znalosti jsou preferovány pro odůvodnění odpovědí pro adaptovaná i hot-swap nastavení.', 'ca': "El marc retriever-reader és popular per respondre a preguntes de domini obert (ODQA) degut a la seva habilitat d'utilitzar coneixements explícits. Encara que la feina anterior ha intentat augmentar la cobertura del coneixement incorporant coneixements estructurats més enllà del text, l'accés a fonts heterogènes de coneixement a través d'una interfície unificada és una pregunta oberta. Mentre que la generació de dades a text té el potencial de servir com una interfície universal per a les dades i el text, la seva viabilitat per a les tasques avall segueix molt desconeguda. En aquesta feina, comblem aquest buit i utilitzem el mètode de dades a text com a mitjà per codificar coneixements estructurats per respondre a preguntes de domini obert. Concretament, proposem un marc de lector-recuperador-verbalitzador per ODQA sobre dades i text on es fan servir taules verbalitzats de Wikipedia i gràfics de Wikidata com fonts de coneixement augmentates. Mostrem que les nostres dades unificades i textos QA, UDT-QA, poden beneficiar-se efectivament de l'índex de coneixement ampliat, portant a grans guanys sobre les línies de base només de text. Notablement, el nostre enfocament estableix l'estat d'actualitat d'un únic model en qüestions naturals. A més, els nostres anàlisis indiquen que el coneixement verbalitzat és preferit per raonament de resposta tant per configuracions adaptades com per intercanvi de calor.", 'jv': 'Deliverer-reader frame populer kanggo open-domain question responsing (OCqA) kayané kapan tanggal nggawe kelangan langgar.', 'sk': 'Okvir za iskalnik-bralnik je priljubljen za odgovarjanje na vprašanja z odprto domeno (ODQA) zaradi svoje sposobnosti uporabe eksplicitnega znanja.', 'he': 'המסגרת של הקריא-המחזיר פופולרית לענות על שאלות בתחום פתוח (ODQA) בגלל היכולת שלה להשתמש בידע ברור.', 'ha': 'The retriever-reader framework is popular for open-domain question answering (ODQA) due to its ability to use explicit knowledge.', 'bo': 'retriever-reader framework is popular for open-domain answer (ODQA)due to its ability to use explicit knowledge.'}
{'en': 'What Makes Reading Comprehension Questions Difficult', 'ar': 'جيل إعادة الصياغة المبدئي مع النص الموازي', 'pt': 'Geração de paráfrases com princípios com corpora paralelos', 'fr': 'Génération de paraphrases raisonnées avec des corpus parallèles', 'es': 'Generación de paráfrasis basada en principios con corpus paralelos', 'ja': 'パラレルコーポラルでの原理的パラフレーズ生成', 'zh': '用并行语料库原则性释义生', 'hi': 'समानांतर निगम के साथ सैद्धांतिक पैराफ़्रेज़ जनरेशन', 'ru': 'Принципиальная генерация парафраз с параллельными корпусами', 'ga': 'Athinsint Phrionsabail a Ghiniúint le Corpora Comhthreomhar', 'ka': 'პრინციპური პარაფრეზის შექმნა პარალელი კორპორაName', 'hu': 'Alapelv parafráz generáció párhuzamos kormával', 'el': 'Αρχή δημιουργίας παραφράσεων με παράλληλο σώμα', 'it': 'Generazione di parafrasi di principio con Corpora Parallela', 'kk': 'Бағытталған парафра параллель корпорасымен құрылған', 'lt': 'Pagrindinės parafrazių generacijos kartu su paraleline korpora', 'mk': 'Генерација на принципи на парафрази со паралелна корпора', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Parafrasa Prinsip dengan Korpora Paralel', 'ml': 'പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപോരിയോടൊപ്പം പ്രിന്\u200dസിഫ്രസ് പാരാഫ്രസ് ജന്\u200dമെനെഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni Prinċipjata ta’ Parafrażi ma’ Korpora Paralleli', 'mn': 'Үндсэн Парафразын төрөл Параллель Корпора', 'no': 'Generering av parafrasar med parallelle korpora', 'pl': 'Generowanie parafraz z korpusem równoległym', 'sr': 'Generacija parafraze sa Paralelnom korporom', 'ro': 'Generarea principială de parafrază cu Corpora paralelă', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සිද්ධානය සමග ප්\u200dරතිචාරය', 'so': 'Generation of Paraphrase with Parallel Corpora', 'sv': 'Principiell parafrasgenerering med parallell korpora', 'ta': 'Parallel கோர்போராவுடன் முதன்மையாக்கப்பட்ட Paraphrase உருவாக்கம்', 'ur': 'پرنسیپٹ پارافریز پیدائش پارالل کورپورا کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tạo tác chữ thiêng với Parallel Corpus', 'hr': 'Generacija parafraze s paralelnom korporom', 'nl': 'Generatie van parafrases met parallel corpora', 'bg': 'Принципно генериране на парафрази с паралелни корпуси', 'da': 'Principielt parafrasegenerering med Parallel Corpora', 'id': 'Generasi Parafrasa Prinsip dengan Korpora Paralel', 'fa': 'نسل پارافریز اصلی با کورپورا پارالل', 'de': 'Prinzipielle Paraphrasenerzeugung mit parallelem Korpora', 'sw': 'Uzalishi Mkuu wa Paraphrase na Korpora ya Parallel', 'tr': 'Principli parafraz Bejer Parallel Corpora bilen döredildi', 'ko': '평행 어료 라이브러리의 원칙적 해석에 기초하여 생성', 'af': 'Genereer parafrase met Parallel Corpora', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i Parafrazave me Korpora Paralele', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Հիմնական պարաֆրեզ ստեղծելը զուգահեռ կորպորայի միջոցով', 'az': 'Parallel Korpora il…ô ƒ∞lk Parafraz M…ôxluqatƒ±', 'bn': 'প্যারালেল কোর্পোরার সাথে প্রধান প্যারাফ্রাজ প্রজন্ম', 'bs': 'Generacija parafraze sa Paralelnom korporom', 'ca': 'Principled Paraphrase Generation amb Parallel Corpora', 'cs': 'Principální generování parafráz s paralelním korpusem', 'et': 'Põhimõtteline paralleelkorporaasi genereerimine', 'fi': 'Periaatuinen rinnakkaislauseiden luominen rinnakkaiskorpusella', 'jv': 'Print', 'sk': 'Načelno ustvarjanje vzporednih fraz z vzporednim korpusom', 'he': 'יצירת פראפרזיה עקרונית עם קורפורה Parallel', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Principled Paraphrase Generation with Parallel Corpora'}
{'en': 'For a natural language understanding benchmark to be useful in research it has to consist of examples that are diverse and difficult enough to discriminate among current and near future state of the art systems However we do not yet know how best to select text sources to collect a variety of challenging examples In this study we crowdsource multiple choice reading comprehension questions for passages taken from seven qualitatively distinct sources analyzing what attributes of passages contribute to the difficulty and question types of the collected examples To our surprise we find that passage source length and readability measures do not significantly affect question difficulty Through our manual annotation of seven reasoning types we observe several trends between passage sources and reasoning types e.g. logical reasoning is more often required in questions written for technical passages These results suggest that when creating a new benchmark dataset selecting a diverse set of passages can help ensure a diverse range of question types but that passage difficulty need not be a priority', 'ar': 'تُعد الترجمة الآلية ذهابًا وإيابًا (MT) خيارًا شائعًا لتوليد إعادة الصياغة ، والتي تستفيد من المجموعات الموازية المتاحة بسهولة للإشراف. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بإضفاء الطابع الرسمي على وظيفة التشابه الضمني التي يسببها هذا النهج ، ونوضح أنها عرضة لمشاركة الأزواج غير المعاد صياغتها في ترجمة واحدة غامضة. استنادًا إلى هذه الأفكار ، نصمم مقياس تشابه بديل يخفف من هذه المشكلة عن طريق طلب توزيع الترجمة بالكامل لمطابقته وتنفيذ تخفيفه من خلال طريقة اختناق المعلومات. يتضمن نهجنا مصطلحًا عدائيًا في تدريب الترجمة الآلية من أجل تعلم التمثيلات التي ترمز أكبر قدر ممكن من المعلومات حول الترجمة المرجعية ، مع الاحتفاظ بأقل قدر ممكن من المعلومات حول المدخلات. يمكن إنشاء إعادة الصياغة عن طريق فك التشفير إلى المصدر من هذا التمثيل ، دون الحاجة إلى إنشاء ترجمات محورية. بالإضافة إلى كونها أكثر مبادئ وكفاءة من الترجمة الآلية ذهابًا وإيابًا ، فإن نهجنا يوفر معلمة قابلة للتعديل للتحكم في مفاضلة التنوع والإخلاص ، والحصول على نتائج أفضل في تجاربنا.', 'es': 'La traducción automática (MT) de ida y vuelta es una opción popular para la generación de paráfrasis, que aprovecha los corpus paralelos fácilmente disponibles para la supervisión. En este artículo, formalizamos la función de similitud implícita inducida por este enfoque, y demostramos que es susceptible a pares sin paráfrasis que comparten una sola traducción ambigua. Sobre la base de estos conocimientos, diseñamos una métrica de similitud alternativa que mitiga este problema al exigir que toda la distribución de traducción coincida e implementamos una relajación de la misma mediante el método de cuello de botella de la información. Nuestro enfoque incorpora un término contradictorio en el entrenamiento de MT para aprender representaciones que codifiquen la mayor cantidad de información posible sobre la traducción de referencia, manteniendo al mismo tiempo la menor información posible sobre la entrada. Las paráfrasis se pueden generar decodificando de nuevo a la fuente desde esta representación, sin tener que generar traducciones pivotantes. Además de ser más eficiente y basado en principios que la MT de ida y vuelta, nuestro enfoque ofrece un parámetro ajustable para controlar la compensación entre la diversidad de fidelidad y obtener mejores resultados en nuestros experimentos.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique aller-retour (TA) est un choix populaire pour la génération de paraphrases, qui exploite des corpus parallèles facilement disponibles pour la supervision. Dans cet article, nous formalisons la fonction de similarité implicite induite par cette approche, et montrons qu'elle est sensible aux paires non paraphrasées partageant une seule traduction ambiguë. Sur la base de ces informations, nous concevons une mesure de similarité alternative qui atténue ce problème en exigeant que l'ensemble de la distribution de traduction corresponde, et en implémenons un assouplissement par le biais de la méthode du goulot d'étranglement des informations. Notre approche intègre un terme contradictoire dans la formation à la traduction automatique afin d'apprendre les représentations qui encodent autant d'informations que possible sur la traduction de référence, tout en conservant le moins d'informations possible sur l'entrée. Les paraphrases peuvent être générées par décodage vers la source à partir de cette représentation, sans avoir à générer de translations pivot. En plus d'être plus raisonnée et plus efficace que la magnétoscopie aller-retour, notre approche offre un paramètre ajustable pour contrôler le compromis fidélité-diversité, et permet d'obtenir de meilleurs résultats dans nos expériences.", 'pt': 'A tradução automática de ida e volta (MT) é uma escolha popular para geração de paráfrases, que aproveita corpora paralelos prontamente disponíveis para supervisão. Neste artigo, formalizamos a função de similaridade implícita induzida por essa abordagem e mostramos que ela é suscetível a pares não paráfrases compartilhando uma única tradução ambígua. Com base nesses insights, projetamos uma métrica de similaridade alternativa que mitiga esse problema exigindo que toda a distribuição de tradução corresponda e implementamos um relaxamento dela por meio do método de gargalo de informações. Nossa abordagem incorpora um termo adversário no treinamento de TA para aprender representações que codificam o máximo possível de informações sobre a tradução de referência, mantendo o mínimo possível de informações sobre a entrada. As paráfrases podem ser geradas decodificando de volta para a fonte desta representação, sem ter que gerar traduções pivô. Além de ser mais baseada em princípios e eficiente do que a MT de ida e volta, nossa abordagem oferece um parâmetro ajustável para controlar o trade-off fidelidade-diversidade e obtém melhores resultados em nossos experimentos.', 'ja': 'ラウンドトリップ機械翻訳（ MT ）は、パラフレーズ生成に人気のある選択肢であり、容易に入手可能な並列コーパスを監督に活用します。 本稿では，このアプローチによって誘導される暗黙の類似性関数を形式化し，単一の曖昧な翻訳を共有する非言い換えペアの影響を受けやすいことを示す． これらの洞察に基づいて、翻訳配布全体を一致させることを要求して、この問題を軽減する代替の類似性指標を設計し、情報ボトルネック法を通じて緩和を実装します。 私たちのアプローチは、参照翻訳に関する可能な限り多くの情報をエンコードする表現を学び、入力に関する情報を可能な限り少なく保つために、MTトレーニングに対抗用語を組み込んでいます。 パラフレーズは、ピボット翻訳を生成することなく、この表現からソースにデコードすることによって生成することができます。 ラウンドトリップMTよりも原則的で効率的であることに加えて、当社のアプローチは、忠実性と多様性のトレードオフを制御するための調整可能なパラメータを提供し、当社の実験でより良い結果を得ることができます。', 'zh': '往返机器翻译 (MT) 释义生常用择,以见成并行语料库监之。 本文之中,形式化此诱隐式相似性函数,并明其易于模糊译者非释义也。 盖以此观之,设一代之相似性指标,求一译之匹以纾之,而信息瓶颈术遂其弛也。 吾法并对抗性术语于机器翻译训练,以尽参译信息之编码,而尽可能少存其息焉。 可以生释义解码回源,无生透视转。 自比往复 MT 更具原则性效率之外,供一调参数以制保真度-分集权衡,而获善于实验。', 'hi': 'राउंड-ट्रिप मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एमटी) पैराफ्रेज़ पीढ़ी के लिए एक लोकप्रिय विकल्प है, जो पर्यवेक्षण के लिए आसानी से उपलब्ध समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट का लाभ उठाता है। इस पेपर में, हम इस दृष्टिकोण से प्रेरित अंतर्निहित समानता फ़ंक्शन को औपचारिक रूप देते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि यह एक एकल अस्पष्ट अनुवाद साझा करने वाले गैर-व्याख्याकार्य जोड़े के लिए अतिसंवेदनशील है। इन अंतर्दृष्टि के आधार पर, हम एक वैकल्पिक समानता मीट्रिक डिज़ाइन करते हैं जो इस समस्या को पूरे अनुवाद वितरण से मेल खाने की आवश्यकता से कम करता है, और सूचना बाधा विधि के माध्यम से इसकी छूट को लागू करता है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण में एमटी प्रशिक्षण में एक प्रतिकूल शब्द शामिल है ताकि प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए जो संदर्भ अनुवाद के बारे में अधिक से अधिक जानकारी को एन्कोड करते हैं, जबकि इनपुट के बारे में जितना संभव हो उतना कम जानकारी रखते हैं। इस प्रतिनिधित्व से स्रोत पर वापस डिकोडिंग करके पैराफ्रेज़ उत्पन्न किए जा सकते हैं, बिना पिवट अनुवाद उत्पन्न किए बिना। राउंड-ट्रिप एमटी की तुलना में अधिक सैद्धांतिक और कुशल होने के अलावा, हमारा दृष्टिकोण निष्ठा-विविधता व्यापार-बंद को नियंत्रित करने के लिए एक समायोज्य पैरामीटर प्रदान करता है, और हमारे प्रयोगों में बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Машинный перевод в оба конца (MT) является популярным выбором для генерации перефразов, который использует легко доступные параллельные корпуса для надзора. В этой статье мы формализуем неявную функцию сходства, вызванную этим подходом, и показываем, что она восприимчива к парам непарафразы, использующим один неоднозначный перевод. Основываясь на этих идеях, мы разрабатываем альтернативную метрику сходства, которая смягчает эту проблему, требуя, чтобы все распределение переводов совпадало, и реализуем его релаксацию с помощью метода информационного узкого места. Наш подход включает состязательный термин в обучение МТ, чтобы узнать представления, которые кодируют как можно больше информации о ссылочном переводе, сохраняя при этом как можно меньше информации о входе. Перефразы могут быть сгенерированы путем декодирования обратно к источнику из этого представления, без необходимости генерировать поворотные преобразования. В дополнение к тому, что наш подход является более принципиальным и эффективным, чем MT в оба конца, он предлагает настраиваемый параметр для управления компромиссом между точностью и разнообразием и получает лучшие результаты в наших экспериментах.', 'ga': 'Is rogha coitianta é Aistriúchán Meaisínithe cuairt bhabhta (MT) chun athinsint a ghiniúint, a ghiaráil corpora comhthreomhar atá ar fáil go héasca le haghaidh maoirseachta. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid foirmeálta ar fheidhm na cosúlachta intuigthe a chothaítear leis an gcur chuige seo, agus léirímid go bhfuil sé so-ghabhálach i gcás péirí neamhfhorleathana aistriúchán débhríoch amháin a roinnt. Bunaithe ar na léargais seo, dearadh againn méadracht cosúlachta eile a mhaolaíonn an tsaincheist seo trí éileamh a dhéanamh ar an dáileadh iomlán aistriúcháin a mheaitseáil, agus a mhaolú a chur i bhfeidhm tríd an modh Scrúdú Faisnéise. Ionchorpraíonn ár gcur chuige téarma sáraíochta in oiliúint MT chun léiriúcháin a fhoghlaim a ionchódaíonn an oiread eolais agus is féidir faoin aistriúchán tagartha, agus a choimeádann chomh beag eolais agus is féidir faoin ionchur. Is féidir athfhrásaí a ghiniúint trí dhíchódú ar ais go dtí an fhoinse ón léiriú seo, gan gá le haistriúcháin mhaighdeogacha a ghiniúint. Chomh maith le bheith níos prionsabálta agus níos éifeachtaí ná MT turas cruinn, cuireann ár gcur chuige paraiméadar inchoigeartaithe ar fáil chun an trádáil dhílseachta-éagsúlacht a rialú, agus faigheann sé torthaí níos fearr inár gcuid turgnaimh.', 'ka': 'პარაფრაზეზის დავიწყებისთვის პოლუბური მოქმედება, რომელიც ძალიან მოსაძლევებელი პარალელი კოპორა მონაცემებისთვის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ფორმაციალურად გამოიყენებთ ინფლიციტური სხვადასხვა ფუნქცია, რომელიც ამ პროგრამის გამოიყენება და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს არაფრაფეზის ზოგებისთვის გავუყენებელია, რო ამ შესახებების ბაზაზე, ჩვენ დავყენებთ ალტენტრუმენტური სინამდვილეობის მეტრიკი, რომელიც ამ პრობლემას შემცირებას, რომელიც უნდა გადაწყენოთ ყველა გადაწყვეტილების გადაწყვეტილება და ინფორ ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებელად გამოყენება, რომლებიც შესაძლებელია, რომ გავისწავლოთ გამოყენებები, რომლებიც შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებელია შესაძლებ Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation, without having to generate pivot translations. დამატებით, რომ უფრო პრინციპური და ეფექტიური იყოს MT-ზე, ჩვენი პროგრამა უფრო აკეთესებელი პარამეტრი, რომელიც კონტროლისტურად განსხვავებულობის შესაძლებლობად მოიძლება, და ჩ', 'el': "Η μηχανική μετάφραση μετ' επιστροφής (ΜΤ) είναι μια δημοφιλής επιλογή για την παραγωγή παραφράσεων, η οποία αξιοποιεί άμεσα διαθέσιμα παράλληλα σώματα για την εποπτεία. Στην παρούσα εργασία, επισημοποιούμε τη σιωπηρή συνάρτηση ομοιότητας που προκαλείται από αυτή την προσέγγιση, και αποδεικνύουμε ότι είναι ευάλωτη σε μη παραφράσεις ζεύγη που μοιράζονται μια ενιαία αμφίβολη μετάφραση. Με βάση αυτές τις γνώσεις, σχεδιάζουμε μια εναλλακτική μετρική ομοιότητας που μετριάζει αυτό το ζήτημα απαιτώντας ολόκληρη τη διανομή μετάφρασης να ταιριάζει, και εφαρμόζουμε μια χαλάρωση της μέσω της μεθόδου Πληροφόρησης. Η προσέγγισή μας ενσωματώνει έναν αντίπαλο όρο στην εκπαίδευση ΜΤ προκειμένου να μάθουμε αναπαραστάσεις που κωδικοποιούν όσο το δυνατόν περισσότερες πληροφορίες σχετικά με τη μετάφραση αναφοράς, διατηρώντας παράλληλα όσο το δυνατόν λιγότερες πληροφορίες σχετικά με την εισαγωγή. Παράφράσεις μπορούν να δημιουργηθούν αποκωδικοποιώντας πίσω στην πηγή από αυτή την αναπαράσταση, χωρίς να χρειάζεται να δημιουργήσετε μεταγραφές περιστροφής. Εκτός από το ότι είναι πιο θεμελιώδης και αποδοτική από το μετ' επιστροφής, η προσέγγισή μας προσφέρει μια ρυθμιζόμενη παράμετρο για τον έλεγχο του συμβιβασμού πιστότητας-ποικιλομορφίας, και επιτυγχάνει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα στα πειράματά μας.", 'hu': 'A fordulós gépi fordítás (MT) népszerű választás a parafráz generálásához, amely a könnyen elérhető párhuzamos corporákat használja a felügyelethez. Ebben a tanulmányban formalizáljuk a megközelítés által indukált implicit hasonlósági függvényt, és megmutatjuk, hogy ez hajlamos arra, hogy a nem parafráz párok egyetlen kétértelmű fordítást osztanak meg. Ezen ismeretek alapján olyan alternatív hasonlósági mutatót tervezünk, amely enyhíti ezt a problémát azáltal, hogy a teljes fordítási terjesztést megköveteljük, és ennek lazítását az Information Bottleneck módszerrel hajtjuk végre. Megközelítésünk egy ellentétes kifejezést foglal magába az MT képzésbe annak érdekében, hogy olyan reprezentációkat tanuljunk meg, amelyek a lehető legtöbb információt kódolják a referencia fordításról, miközben a lehető legkevesebb információt tartjuk meg a bemenetről. Parafrázások generálhatók úgy, hogy visszadekódolnak a forráshoz ebből a reprezentációból, anélkül, hogy pivot fordításokat kellene generálniuk. Amellett, hogy elvileg és hatékonyabb, mint a visszaút MT, megközelítésünk egy állítható paramétert kínál a hűség-sokszínűség kereskedelem ellenőrzésére, és jobb eredményeket ér el kísérleteink során.', 'kk': 'Машина аударуы (MT) парафразды құру үшін әлемді таңдау. Бұл бақылау үшін параллель корпораға жеткілікті көмектеседі. Бұл қағазда біз бұл жағдайда көмектесетін ұқсастық функциясын оқып, бұл парафра емес екеуіне бір жалғыз аудармасын ортақтастыру мүмкіндігін көрсеткіземіз. Бұл түсініктердің негізінде, бұл мәселеді көшірмелейтін альтернативті метрикалық құрамыз. Бұл мәселеді толық аудармалардың үлестірімін сәйкес керек және мәліметтің ақпараттарының көшірмес Біздің тәсіліміз MT оқытуына қарсы термині қолданып, сілтеменің аудармасы туралы маңызды мәліметтерді оқыту үшін, бірақ келтірілген мәліметтер туралы кейбір мәліметті қолдану үші Пиvot аудармасын құру керек болмаса, параметрлерді көзінің декодтамасынан қайта құрылады. Біздің көпшілігіміз MT-ден артық және ефективдік болу үшін сенімділік және әртүрлік тәртүрлікті параметрін бақылау үшін жұмыс істейтін параметрімізді ұсынады, және біздің тә', 'it': "La traduzione automatica di andata e ritorno (MT) è una scelta popolare per la generazione di parafrasi, che sfrutta corpi paralleli facilmente disponibili per la supervisione. In questo articolo, formalizziamo la funzione di somiglianza implicita indotta da questo approccio, e mostriamo che è suscettibile a coppie non parafrase che condividono una singola traduzione ambigua. Sulla base di queste informazioni, progettiamo una metrica di somiglianza alternativa che mitiga questo problema richiedendo che l'intera distribuzione della traduzione corrisponda e implementiamo un rilassamento attraverso il metodo Information Bottleneck. Il nostro approccio incorpora un termine contraddittorio nella formazione MT al fine di imparare rappresentazioni che codificano quante più informazioni possibile sulla traduzione di riferimento, mantenendo al contempo meno informazioni possibile sull'input. Le parafrase possono essere generate decodificando la sorgente da questa rappresentazione, senza dover generare traduzioni pivot. Oltre ad essere più principi ed efficienti della MT andata e ritorno, il nostro approccio offre un parametro regolabile per controllare il trade-off fedeltà-diversità e ottiene risultati migliori nei nostri esperimenti.", 'mk': 'Машинска транслекција за круг пат (MT) е популарен избор за генерација на парафрази, што користи лесно достапна паралелна корпора за надзор. Во овој документ, ја формализираме имплицитната функција на сличност индуцирана од овој пристап, и покажуваме дека е чувствителна на парови без парафраза кои делат едно двогледно превод. На основа на овие увидувања, дизајнираме алтернативна метрика на сличност која го намали ова прашање со барање целата дистрибуција на превод да се совпаѓа, и спроведуваме релаксација на тоа преку методот Информации Bottleneck. Нашиот пристап вклучува непријателски термин во обуката за МТ со цел да се научат претставувања кои кодираат колку што е можно повеќе информации за референцискиот превод, а истовремено да се чуваат најмалку информации за влогот. Парафразите можат да се генерираат со декодирање назад во изворот од оваа претстава, без да се генерира превод на вртење. Покрај тоа што сме попринципирани и ефикасни отколку круг пат МТ, нашиот пристап нуди прилагодлив параметр за контрола на размената на верноста и различноста, и добива подобри резултати во нашите експерименти.', 'lt': 'Apskrito kelionės mašinų vertimas (MT) yra populiarus parafrazių generavimo pasirinkimas, kuris padeda lengvai prieinamam lygiagrečiam korpusui prižiūrėti. Šiame dokumente formalizuojame netiesioginę panašumo funkciją, kurią sukelia šis metodas, ir parodomi, kad ji jautri ne parafrazės poroms, turinčioms vieną dviprasmišką vertimą. Remiantis šiais įžvalgomis, sukuriame alternatyvią panašumo metriją, kuri švelnintų šį klausimą, reikalaudami, kad visą vertimo paskirstymą atitiktų, ir ją palengvintų taikant Informacinio užpakalio metodą. Mūsų požiūris į MT mokymą įtraukia priešingą term in ą, kad būtų mokomi atstovai, koduojantys kiek įmanoma daugiau informacijos apie referencinį vertimą, kartu saugodami kiek įmanoma mažiau informacijos apie duomenis. Parafrazės gali būti generuojamos dekoduojant atgal į šaltinį iš šio paveikslo, nereikalaujant sukti vertimų. Be to, kad esame labiau pagrįsti principais ir veiksmingi nei apskritojo kelionės MT metodas, mūsų metodas siūlo patikslinamą parametrą, kad būtų galima kontroliuoti patikimumo ir įvairovės kompromisą ir pasiekti geresnių rezultatų mūsų eksperimentuose.', 'ms': 'Perjalanan-bulat Mesin Terjemahan (MT) adalah pilihan popular untuk generasi parafrasa, yang menggunakan corpora selari yang mudah tersedia untuk pengawasan. Dalam kertas ini, kita formalkan fungsi persamaan implicit yang disebabkan oleh pendekatan ini, dan menunjukkan bahawa ia susah untuk pasangan bukan-parafrasa berkongsi satu terjemahan yang ambiguh. Berdasarkan pandangan ini, kita merancang metrik persamaan alternatif yang mengurangi isu ini dengan memerlukan keseluruhan distribusi terjemahan untuk sepadan, dan melaksanakan perlahankannya melalui kaedah Information Bottleneck. Our approach incorporates an adversarial term into MT training in order to learn representations that encode as much information about the reference translation as possible, while keeping as little information about the input as possible.  Parafrasa boleh dijana dengan menyahkod semula ke sumber dari perwakilan ini, tanpa perlu menghasilkan terjemahan pivot. Selain menjadi lebih prinsip dan efisien daripada MT perjalanan bulat, pendekatan kita menawarkan parameter yang boleh disesuaikan untuk mengawal perjalanan kesetiaan-kebanyakan, dan mendapat keputusan yang lebih baik dalam eksperimen kita.', 'mt': 'It-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju b’vjaġġ tond (MT) hija għa żla popolari għall-ġenerazzjoni tal-parafrażi, li tagħti spinta lil korpra parallel a disponibbli faċilment għas-superviżjoni. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nifformalizzaw il-funzjoni impliċit a ta’ similarità indotta minn dan l-approċċ, u nuru li hija suxxettibbli għal par mhux parafrażiċi li jaqsmu traduzzjoni ambigwa waħda. Fuq il-bażi ta’ dawn l-għarfien, a ħna niddisinjaw metrika alternattiva ta’ similarità li tnaqqas din il-kwistjoni billi nħtieġu li d-distribuzzjoni kollha tat-traduzzjoni taqbel, u nimplimentawha rilassament permezz tal-metodu ta’ l-Information Bottleneck. Our approach incorporates an adversarial term into MT training in order to learn representations that encode as much information about the reference translation as possible, while keeping as little information about the input as possible.  Il-parafrażijiet jistgħu jiġu ġġenerati permezz tad-dekodifikazzjoni lura għas-sors minn din ir-rappreżentanza, mingħajr ma jkun hemm bżonn li jiġu ġġenerati traduzzjonijiet pivoti. Minbarra li nkunu aktar prinċipjati u effiċjenti mill-MT ta’ vjaġġ tond, l-approċċ tagħna joffri parametru aġġustabbli biex jikkontrolla l-kompromess bejn il-fidelità u d-diversità, u jikseb riżultati aħjar fl-esperimenti tagħna.', 'mn': 'Машин хөндлөн хөндлөн хөндлөн хөндлөн хөндлөн хөндлөн (MT) нь парафрейз үеийн алдартай сонголт юм. Энэ нь удирдлагатай параллел корпора ашиглаж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ арга хэмжээнд хүргэсэн нэг төстэй төстэй функцийг зааж өгч, нэг хэлбэртэй орчуулалт хуваалцаж байгааг харуулж байна. Эдгээр ойлголтын үндсэндээ бид энэ асуудлыг багасгаж буй өөр нэг төстэй метрик загвар зохион байгуулдаг. Энэ асуудлыг бүх орчуулалтын хуваарилалтыг тоглох шаардлагатай. Мэдээлэл Ботлеneck аргын арга хэмжээгээр Бидний арга зам нь MT сургалтын тулд эсрэг томъёог хамгийн бага мэдээллийг хадгалах боломжтой боломжтой боломжтой томъёог олгодог илтгэлийг сурах боломжтой болно. Парафрейз нь энэ илтгэлийн эх үүсвэрт шилжүүлж чадна. pivot орчуулалтыг бий болгох шаардлагагүй. МТ-ээс илүү үндсэн, үр дүнтэй байхдаа бидний арга барилга нь итгэлтэй, олон төрлийн худалдааныг удирдах боломжтой параметр өгдөг. Мөн бидний туршилтаар илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (എംടി) പാരാഫ്രേസ് തലമുറയ്ക്കുള്ള ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട തെരഞ്ഞെടുപ്പാണ്. അത് എളുപ്പമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ നടപടിയിലൂടെ തുടങ്ങിയ ഒരേപോലുള്ള പ്രവൃത്തിക്കാണിക്കുന്ന പ്രത്യേക പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തെ രൂപപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പ്രത്യ Based on these insights, we design an alternative similarity metric that mitigates this issue by requiring the entire translation distribution to match, and implement a relaxation of it through the Information Bottleneck method.  നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദ്യം എംടി പരിശീലനത്തിലേക്ക് ഒരു വിരോധവാക്ക് ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d എംടി പരിശീലനത്തിലേക് ഈ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സ്രോതസ്സിലേക്ക് തിരിച്ചുവരുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പാരാഫ്രസുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ വിശ്വാസത്തിലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യാപാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d നിയന്ത്രിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രാധാന്യം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധ', 'pl': 'Okrągłe tłumaczenie maszynowe (MT) jest popularnym wyborem do generowania parafraz, które wykorzystuje łatwo dostępne równoległe korpusy do nadzoru. W niniejszym artykule sformalizujemy funkcję domyślnego podobieństwa indukowaną przez to podejście i pokazujemy, że jest ona podatna na pary nieparafrazowe dzielące pojedyncze niejednoznaczne tłumaczenie. Na podstawie tych spostrzeżeń projektujemy alternatywną metrykę podobieństwa, która łagodzi ten problem poprzez wymaganie dopasowania całej dystrybucji tłumaczenia i wdrożenie jej relaksacji za pomocą metody Information Bottleneck. Nasze podejście uwzględnia termin przeciwny do szkolenia MT, aby nauczyć się reprezentacji, które kodują jak najwięcej informacji o tłumaczeniu referencyjnym, przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu jak najmniej informacji o danym wejściu. Parafrazy mogą być generowane poprzez dekodowanie z powrotem do źródła z tej reprezentacji, bez konieczności generowania tłumaczeń pivot. Oprócz tego, że nasze podejście jest bardziej zasadnicze i wydajne niż MT w obrębie, oferuje regulowany parametr kontroli kompromisu wierności i różnorodności oraz uzyskuje lepsze wyniki w naszych eksperymentach.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată dus-întors (MT) este o alegere populară pentru generarea de parafraze, care utilizează corporații paralele ușor disponibile pentru supraveghere. În această lucrare, formalizăm funcția implicită de similitudine indusă de această abordare și arătăm că este susceptibilă la perechile non-parafrază care împărtășesc o singură traducere ambiguă. Pe baza acestor cunoștințe, proiectăm o metrică alternativă de similitudine care atenuează această problemă solicitând întregii distribuții de traducere să se potrivească și implementăm o relaxare a acesteia prin metoda Information Bottleneck. Abordarea noastră include un termen adversar în instruirea MT pentru a învăța reprezentări care codează cât mai multe informații despre traducerea de referință posibil, păstrând în același timp cât mai puține informații despre intrare posibil. Parafrazele pot fi generate prin decodarea înapoi la sursă din această reprezentare, fără a fi nevoie să genereze traduceri pivot. Pe lângă faptul că este mai principială și mai eficientă decât MT dus-întors, abordarea noastră oferă un parametru reglabil pentru a controla comerțul fidelitate-diversitate și obține rezultate mai bune în experimentele noastre.', 'no': 'Rundtrekkeomsetjing av maskinen (MT) er ein populært val for parafrase- generering, som leverer lett tilgjengelege parallelle korpora for oversikt. I denne papiret formaliserer vi den implisitte likningsfunksjonen som er indusert av denne tilnærminga, og viser at det er viktig til ikkje- parafrasiske par som deler ei enkelt omsetjing. Basert på desse opplysningane, designerer vi ein alternativ similaritet metrisk som minkar dette problemet ved å kreve heile oversettelsdistribusjonen til å passa, og implementerer ein relaksjon av det gjennom informasjonsbottleneckmetoden. Tilnærminga vårt inkluderer ein negativ uttrykk i MT-opplæring for å lære representasjonar som koder så mykje informasjon om referansomsetjinga som mulig, mens du held så lite informasjon om inndata som mulig. Parafrasar kan lagast ved å dekode tilbake til kjelden frå denne representasjonen, utan å laga pivotomsetjingar. I tillegg til å vera meir prinsippet og effektivt enn rundtreise MT, tilnærminga vårt tilbyr ein korrektbar parameter for å kontrollera utviklinga av fidelitet-diversitet, og får bedre resultat i eksperimentene våre.', 'sr': 'Prevod mašine okružnog putovanja (MT) je popularan izbor za generaciju parafraze, koji utiče na lako dostupnu paralelnu korporu za nadzor. U ovom papiru formaliziramo implicitnu funkciju sličnosti indukovanu ovim pristupom i pokazujemo da je to osjetljivo na parove koji nisu parafraze delili jednog dvosmislenog prevoda. Na temelju tih uvjeta, mi dizajniramo alternativnu metriku sličnosti koja smanjuje ovaj problem zahtevajući cijelu distribuciju prevoda da se poklapa i provodimo opuštenje toga putem metode informacionih bočica. Naš pristup uključuje neprijateljski term in u obuku MT-a kako bi naučili predstave koje kodiraju najviše informacija o prevodu referencije što je moguće, dok držimo najmanje informacije o ulazu. Parafraze se mogu stvoriti dekodiranjem natrag na izvor iz ovog predstavljanja, a da ne proizvedem prevode pivota. Pored toga da budemo glavniji i efikasniji od MT-a na krug putovanja, naš pristup nudi prilagodljiv parameter da kontroliše trgovinu vjernosti i raznolikosti i dobije bolji rezultat u našim eksperimentima.', 'sv': 'Round-trip Machine Translation (MT) är ett populärt val för parafrasgenerering, som utnyttjar lättillgängliga parallella corpora för övervakning. I denna uppsats formaliserar vi den implicita likhetsfunktionen som induceras av detta tillvägagångssätt, och visar att den är mottaglig för icke-parafraspar som delar en enda tvetydig översättning. Baserat på dessa insikter utformar vi ett alternativt likhetsmått som lindrar problemet genom att kräva att hela översättningsdistributionen matchar, och implementerar en avslappning av det genom informationsflaskhalsmetoden. Vårt tillvägagångssätt inkluderar en kontradiktorisk term i MT utbildning för att lära sig representationer som kodar så mycket information om referensöversättningen som möjligt, samtidigt som man behåller så lite information om indata som möjligt. Parafraser kan genereras genom att avkoda tillbaka till källan från denna representation, utan att behöva generera pivotöversättningar. Förutom att vara mer principiell och effektiv än tur och retur MT erbjuder vårt tillvägagångssätt en justerbar parameter för att kontrollera trohet-mångfald-avvägningen, och får bättre resultat i våra experiment.', 'si': 'Round-trip machine translation (MT) is a pop-up option for parafr. This is a ready comparison Corcora for supervisor. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරවේශනය නොප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන මේ අදහස් වලින්, අපි වෙනස් සමාන්\u200dයතාවක් සිද්ධා කරනවා මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා මුළු වාර්තාවක් විතරය සඳහා මුළ අපේ අභිවිධානය සම්බන්ධ විරෝධ වාර්තාවක් MT ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණයට සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, සම්බන්ධ පැරැෆ්රේස්ට් සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් මෙම ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්වාසයෙන් ආපහු ප්\u200d ඒ වගේම රුන්ඩ් ට්\u200dරිප් MT වඩා වැඩි ප්\u200dරධානයක් සහ හැකියාවක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් විශ්වාසිතාවක් ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් පාලනය කරන්න', 'so': 'Turjumista mashiinka ku wareegsan (MT) waa doorasho maaruf ah oo ku qoran farshaxanka, kaas oo si fudud u heli karta korporada parallel oo la ilaaliyo. Qoraalkan waxaynu formidaynaa waxqabadka siman ee halkan lagu sameeyo, waxaana muujinnaa in ay shaki u leedahay labada qof oo aan isku mid ahayn oo u qaybsanaya tarjuman kaliya. Sida lagu saleynayo aragtidan, waxaynu qoraynaa metric kale oo isku mid ah, kaas oo hoos u dhigi karta tarjumaadda oo dhan oo u baahan karta inay u kaalmeeyaan, waxaana lagu soo dejin karo qalabka macluumaadka Bottleneck. Dhaqdhaheenna waxaa ku qoraya hadal ka gees ah waxbarashada MT si aad u barto wakiilada ku qoran macluumaad ku saabsan turjumista reference sida u suurtagal ah, iyadoo ku haysta macluumaad yar oo ku saabsan injiilka. Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation, without having to generate pivot translations.  Inta ka sokow kuwa la hogaansan yahay oo ka faa’iido badan safarka MT, dhaqdhaqaaqyadeenu wuxuu bixiyaa heer la hagaajin karo si ay u maamulaan dhamaadka ganacsiga kala duduwan, waxaana heli karaa arimahayaga ka wanaagsan.', 'ta': 'சுற்று- பயணி இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (MT) அளபுரு உருவாக்கத்திற்கு ஒரு பிரபலமான தேர்வு, அது சுலபமாக காண்பிக்கும் இணை நி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த செயல்பாட்டின் மூலம் தொடங்கிய பொருள் ஒத்துமையான செயல்பாட்டை வடிவமைக்கிறோம், மற்றும் அது ஒரு ஒற்றை மொழிப இந்த குறிப்புகளை அடிப்படையில் நாம் ஒரு மாற்று ஒத்த முறையை வடிவமைக்கிறோம். இது பிரச்சனையை முழு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பங்கீட்டு பொருத்த வேண்டும்  எங்கள் செயல்பாடு MT பயிற்சியில் ஒரு எதிர்ப்பு வார்த்தையை சேர்க்கும் பொழுது குறியீட்டு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பற்றிய தகவலை கற்றுக் கொள பிவாட் மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை உருவாக்காமல் இந்த குறிப்பிட்ட மூலத்திற்கு மீண்டும் குறியீட்டை உருவாக்கலாம். மேலும் சுற்றி சுற்றி பயணம் MT விட அதிகமாக இருக்கும் மற்றும் தேவையாக இருக்கும் தவிர, நம்முடைய அளபுருவு நம்பிக்கை பல்வேறு வணிக வியாபாரத்தை கட்', 'ur': 'Round-trip Machine Translation اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اس طریقہ سے پیدا کیا ہوا غیر پارافریز جوڑوں کے ساتھ ایک غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر یہ نظریں پر بنیاد ہے، ہم ایک الٹی شبہ متریک طراحی کرتے ہیں جو اس مسئلہ کو کمزور کرتا ہے، تمام ترجمہ تقسیم کے مطابق مطابق، اور اس کے ذریعہ ایک رالکس کرتا ہے، Information Bottleneck روش کے ذریعہ. ہماری طریقہ ایک مخالف ٹریمین میں MT ترینس میں شامل ہے تاکہ نمونات سکھائیں جو مرتبہ ترجمہ کے بارے میں بہت سی معلومات کے ذریعہ کوڈ کریں، حالانکہ اس کے سوال کے بارے میں بہت کم معلومات رکھیں. Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation, without having to generate pivot translations. راندٹریپ MT سے زیادہ منظور اور مفید ہونے کے علاوہ، ہماری طریقہ ایک سیدھا پارامتر پیش کرتا ہے کہ وفاداری اور مختلف تجارت کی کنٹرول کرے، اور ہمارے آزمائش میں بہتر نتیجے حاصل کرے.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda biz bu usul bilan ishga tushirilgan bir xil funksiyasini formatlash, va bu bir g'oyalar tarjima qilishga shaklga ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Bu ko'rinishlar asosida, biz bu muammolarni o'zgartirish uchun butun tarjima tarjima tarjima qilish kerak va bu narsalarni maʼlumot Bottleneck usuli orqali o'zgartirish kerak. Bizning usuli muvaffaqiyatsiz boʻlgan tarjima tarjima haqida maʼlumotni o'rganish uchun MT ta'minlovchi so'zni o'rganish uchun juda qiymati so'zlariga qo'yish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Ko'pchilik MT'dan ko'proq boshqaruvchi bo'lganligidan foydalanishimiz darajaga qarab, bizning fikrlarimiz haqiqatgina tizimni boshqarish uchun yetarli parametrlarni o'zgartiradi, va bizning tajribalarimizga yaxshi natijalarni olib keladi.", 'vi': 'Dịch cỗ máy tròn chuyến đi (MTV) là sự lựa chọn phổ biến cho việc sản xuất tập ảnh liệt, nhờ đó có sẵn Hạ sĩ song song để giám sát. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi chính thức hoá chức năng giống nhau ẩn do cách tiếp cận này, và cho thấy nó dễ bị ảnh hưởng bởi các cặp không bị liệt chia sẻ một bản dịch mơ hồ duy nhất. Dựa trên những nhận thức này, chúng tôi thiết kế một thước đo khác nhau để giảm bớt vấn đề này bằng cách yêu cầu tổng bộ phân phối dịch kết hợp, và thực hiện một sự thư giãn thông qua phương pháp Thông tin Bottleneck. Theo phương pháp của chúng ta, có một thuật ngữ nghịch ngợm trong khóa huấn luyện MTV để học được các diễn viên đã mã hóa càng nhiều thông tin về dịch tham chiếu càng tốt, trong khi giữ càng ít thông tin về nội dung càng tốt. Những cụm từ có thể được tạo ra bằng cách giải mã về nguồn từ đại diện này, mà không cần tạo ra dịch pivot. Ngoài khả năng hiệu quả và hiệu quả hơn con đường tròn MTV, phương pháp của chúng ta cung cấp một tham số điều chỉnh để kiểm soát sự trao đổi đa dạng trung thành, và có kết quả tốt hơn trong các thí nghiệm của chúng ta.', 'bg': 'Машинният превод (МТ) е популярен избор за генериране на парафрази, което използва лесно достъпни паралелни корпуси за надзор. В тази статия ние формализираме имплицитната функция за сходство, индуцирана от този подход, и показваме, че тя е податлива на непарафразни двойки, споделящи един двусмислен превод. Въз основа на тези прозрения ние проектираме алтернативен показател за сходство, който смекчава този проблем, като изисква цялото разпространение на преводите да съвпада, и прилагаме облекчаване на него чрез метода на информационната врата. Нашият подход включва в обучението по МТ термин, за да научим репрезентации, които кодират възможно най-много информация за референтния превод, като същевременно запазваме възможно най-малко информация за входа. Парафразите могат да бъдат генерирани чрез декодиране обратно към източника от това представяне, без да се налага генериране на въртящи се преводи. Освен че е по-принципен и ефективен от двупосочния МТ, нашият подход предлага регулируем параметър за контрол на компромиса вярност-разнообразие и постига по-добри резултати в нашите експерименти.', 'nl': 'Round-trip Machine Translation (MT) is een populaire keuze voor het genereren van parafrases, die gebruik maakt van gemakkelijk beschikbare parallelle corpora voor toezicht. In dit artikel formaliseren we de impliciete gelijkenisfunctie die door deze benadering wordt veroorzaakt, en laten we zien dat deze gevoelig is voor niet-parafraseparen die één enkele dubbelzinnige vertaling delen. Op basis van deze inzichten ontwerpen we een alternatieve vergelijkingsmetrica die dit probleem verzacht door te eisen dat de volledige vertaaldistributie overeenkomt, en implementeren we een versoepeling ervan via de Information Bottleneck methode. Onze aanpak integreert een tegenstrijdige term in MT training om representaties te leren die zoveel mogelijk informatie over de referentievertaling coderen, terwijl er zo weinig mogelijk informatie over de input wordt bewaard. Parafrases kunnen worden gegenereerd door terug te decoderen naar de bron vanuit deze representatie, zonder pivot vertalingen te hoeven genereren. Naast dat onze aanpak principeler en efficiënter is dan round-trip MT, biedt onze aanpak een instelbare parameter om de loyality-diversity compromis te beheersen, en behaalt ze betere resultaten in onze experimenten.', 'da': 'Round-trip Machine Translation (MT) er et populært valg til parafrasegenerering, som udnytter let tilgængelige parallelle korpora til overvågning. I denne artikel formaliserer vi den implicitte lighedsfunktion, der fremkaldes af denne tilgang, og viser, at den er modtagelig for ikke-parafrase par, der deler en enkelt tvetydig oversættelse. Baseret på disse indsigter designer vi en alternativ lighedsmetric, der afhjælper dette problem ved at kræve, at hele oversættelsesdistributionen matcher, og implementerer en afslapning af det gennem informationsflaskehalsmetoden. Vores tilgang indarbejder et kontradiktorisk term i MT træning for at lære repræsentationer, der koder så meget information om referenceoversættelsen som muligt, samtidig med at du beholder så lidt information om input som muligt. Parafraser kan genereres ved at afkode tilbage til kilden fra denne repræsentation, uden at skulle generere pivot oversættelser. Ud over at være mere principbaseret og effektiv end tur-tur MT, tilbyder vores tilgang en justerbar parameter til at styre trofasthed-diversitet trade-off, og opnår bedre resultater i vores eksperimenter.', 'hr': 'Prevod strojeva za okružno putovanje (MT) je popularan izbor za generaciju parafraze, koji utječe na lako dostupnu paralelnu korporu za nadzor. U ovom papiru formaliziramo implicitnu funkciju sličnosti induciranu ovim pristupom i pokazujemo da je osjetljiv na parove koji nisu parafraze dijele jednog dvosmislenog prevoda. Na temelju tih uvida, dizajniramo alternativnu metriku sličnosti koja smanjuje ovaj problem zahtjevom da se cijela distribucija prevoda odgovara i provodi opuštenje toga putem metode informacionih bočica. Naš pristup uključuje neprijateljski term in u obuku MT-a kako bi naučili predstave koje kodiraju što je moguće mnogo informacija o referentnom prevodu, dok držimo najmanje informacije o ulazu. Parafraze se mogu stvoriti dekodiranjem natrag na izvor iz ovog predstavljanja, a ne morati stvoriti pivotske prevode. Osim toga što smo principalniji i učinkovitiji od MT-a na krug putovanja, naš pristup nudi prilagodljiv parameter za kontrolu trgovine vjernosti i raznolikosti i dobiti bolji rezultat u našim eksperimentima.', 'de': 'Round-Trip Machine Translation (MT) ist eine beliebte Wahl für die Paraphrasengeneration, die leicht verfügbare parallele Korpora für die Überwachung nutzt. In diesem Beitrag formalisieren wir die implizite Ähnlichkeitsfunktion, die durch diesen Ansatz induziert wird, und zeigen, dass sie anfällig für Nicht-Paraphrasenpaare ist, die eine einzige mehrdeutige Übersetzung teilen. Basierend auf diesen Erkenntnissen entwerfen wir eine alternative Ähnlichkeitsmetrik, die dieses Problem mindert, indem die gesamte Übersetzungsverteilung übereinstimmt, und implementieren eine Lockerung dieser durch die Information Bottleneck-Methode. Unser Ansatz bezieht einen kontradierenden Begriff in das MT-Training ein, um Darstellungen zu lernen, die so viele Informationen über die Referenzübersetzung wie möglich kodieren und dabei so wenig Informationen über die Eingabe wie möglich behalten. Paraphrasen können erzeugt werden, indem man aus dieser Darstellung zurück zur Quelle decodiert, ohne Pivot-Übersetzungen generieren zu müssen. Unser Ansatz ist nicht nur prinzipieller und effizienter als Round-Trip-MT, sondern bietet auch einen einstellbaren Parameter zur Kontrolle des Treue-Diversity-Kompromisses und erzielt bessere Ergebnisse in unseren Experimenten.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین گردش (MT) یک انتخاب محبوب برای نسل پارافریز است که به آسانی در دسترسی شرکت parallel برای تماشا می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما عملکرد مشابه شبیه\u200cای که توسط این روش پیدا می\u200cشود را رسم می\u200cدهیم، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آن به جفت\u200cهای غیر پارافریز مشابه\u200cای است که یک ترجمه\u200cای غیر مشابه را تقسیم می\u200cکنند. بر اساس این مشاهده\u200cها، ما یک متریک شبیه\u200cای دیگر طراحی می\u200cکنیم که این مسئله را کم می\u200cکند، با نیازی به کل توزیع ترجمه\u200cای برای مسابقه\u200cای، و یک آرامش از آن را به طریق روش شیشه\u200cای اطلاعات انجام می\u200cدهیم. دستور ما یک کلمه دشمنی را در آموزش MT شامل می\u200cکند تا یاد بگیریم نمایش\u200cدهندگان را که اطلاعات بیشتری درباره ترجمه\u200cهای ارتباط را به اندازه\u200cی ممکن کوچک می\u200cدهند، در حالی که اطلاعات کمی درباره ورودی را به اندازه\u200cی Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation, without having to generate pivot translations. در اضافه به عنوان قانون و موثرت بیشتری از MT مسافرت، دسترسی ما یک پارامتر قابل تغییر قابل توجه برای کنترل تجارت متفاوت و اعتماد مختلف را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد و نتیجه\u200cهای بهتر در آزمایشات ما را می\u200cگیرد.', 'id': 'Round-trip Machine Translation (MT) adalah pilihan populer untuk generasi parafrasa, yang mengakibatkan corpora paralel yang mudah tersedia untuk pengawasan. Dalam kertas ini, kami formalisasi fungsi persamaan implicit yang didorong oleh pendekatan ini, dan menunjukkan bahwa itu mudah untuk pasangan non-parafrasa berbagi satu terjemahan ambigu. Berdasarkan penglihatan ini, kami merancang metrik persamaan alternatif yang mengurangi masalah ini dengan memerlukan seluruh distribusi terjemahan untuk cocok, dan mengimplementasikan relaxasi dari itu melalui metode Informasi Bottleneck. pendekatan kita mengikorporasi istilah lawan ke latihan MT untuk belajar representation yang mengkode sebanyak mungkin informasi tentang terjemahan referensi, sementara menyimpan informasi sebanyak mungkin tentang input. Parafrasa dapat dihasilkan dengan mengekodikan kembali ke sumber dari representation ini, tanpa perlu menghasilkan terjemahan pivot. Selain menjadi lebih prinsip dan efisien daripada MT perjalanan bulat, pendekatan kami menawarkan parameter yang dapat disesuaikan untuk mengendalikan perdagangan kesetiaan-diversitas, dan mendapatkan hasil yang lebih baik dalam eksperimen kami.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya safari za mashine (MT) ni chaguo maarufu kwa kizazi cha upinzani, ambacho kinapatikana kwa urahisi kwa kampuni inayofanana kwa ajili ya kufuatiliwa. Katika gazeti hili, tunatengeneza kazi inayofanana na usawa uliotolewa na mbinu hii, na kuonyesha kwamba inakuwa na mashaka kwa wanandoa wasio na upinzani kushirikisha tafsiri moja isiyo na mashaka. Kutokana na mtazamo huu, tunaunda njia mbadala inayofanana na suala hili kwa kutaka usambazaji wa tafsiri mzima wa kucheza, na kutekeleza mapumziko hayo kupitia njia ya habari Bottleneck. Hatua yetu inaingiza muhula wa kinyume katika mafunzo ya MT ili kujifunza uwakilishi ambao unajumuisha taarifa nyingi kuhusu tafsiri ya maoni kama inavyowezekana, wakati wakiweka taarifa kidogo kuhusu ujumbe unaowezekana. Paraphras inaweza kutengenezwa kwa kupunguza vyanzo vya habari kutoka kwa uwakilishi huu, bila ya lazima kutengeneza tafsiri za kupiga kura. Zaidi ya kuwa kiongozi zaidi na ufanisi zaidi ya safari za MT, mbinu yetu inatoa kiwango cha kuboresha kudhibiti biashara ya uaminifu-tofauti, na kupata matokeo mazuri zaidi katika majaribio yetu.', 'ko': '왕복기계번역(MT)은 해석 생성의 인기 선택으로 기존의 평행 어료 라이브러리를 이용하여 감독한다.본고에서 우리는 이런 방법으로 인해 발생하는 은식 유사 함수를 형식화하고 잘못된 의미 번역을 공유하는 비해석의 영향을 받기 쉽다는 것을 보여준다.이러한 견해를 바탕으로 우리는 대체적인 유사성 도량을 설계하여 전체 번역 분포의 일치를 요구함으로써 이 문제를 완화시키고 정보 병목 방법을 통해 이를 완화시켰다.우리의 방법은 번역문 정보를 최대한 많이 인코딩하여 참고하는 표현을 배우는 동시에 입력 정보를 최대한 적게 보존하기 위해 기계 번역 훈련에 대항적인 용어를 추가했다.디코딩을 통해 이 표시에서 원본 코드로 되돌아와 해석을 만들 수 있으며, 축심 번역을 만들 필요가 없다.왕복 MT보다 더욱 원칙적이고 효율적인 것 외에 우리의 방법은 보정도 - 다양성 균형을 조절할 수 있는 매개 변수를 제공하여 우리의 실험에서 더욱 좋은 결과를 얻었다.', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i makinave të udhëtimit të rrumbullakët (MT) është një zgjedhje popullore për gjeneratën e parafrazave, e cila përdorë korpra paralele të lehtë për mbikqyrje. Në këtë letër, ne formalizojmë funksionin implicit të ngjashmërisë të induktuar nga kjo qasje, dhe tregojmë se është e ndjeshme për çifte jo-parafraza që ndajnë një përkthim të vetme të qartë. Bazuar në këto kuptime, ne dizajnojmë një metrik alternativ të ngjashmërisë që lehtëson këtë çështje duke kërkuar që të gjithë shpërndarja e përkthimit të përputhet, dhe të zbatojmë një lehtësim të saj nëpërmjet metodës Informacion Bottleneck. Përqasja jonë përfshin një term kundërshtar në trainimin e MT me qëllim që të mësojmë përfaqësime që kodojnë sa më shumë informacion rreth përkthimit të referimit sa më të jetë e mundur, duke mbajtur sa më pak informacion rreth hyrjes sa më të jetë e mundur. Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation, without having to generate pivot translations.  Përveç qënies më të parimit dhe më të efektshëm se MT-ja e udhëtimit tonë, qasja jonë ofron një parametrë të përshtatshëm për të kontrolluar ndërmjetësimin e besnikërisë-diversitetit dhe fiton rezultate më të mira në eksperimentet tona.', 'af': "Round- trip Masjien Vertaling (MT) is 'n populêre keuse vir parafrase generasie, wat leeg beskikbaar parallele korpora vir supervisie verwyder. In hierdie papier, ons formaliseer die inplisite gelykenis funksie wat deur hierdie toegang ingevolg is, en wys dat dit is aanvaardig na nie- parafrase paars wat deel 'n enkele ongelukkige vertaling. Ons ontwerp op hierdie insigte 'n alternatiewe gelykenis metriek wat hierdie probleem verminder deur die hele vertaling verspreiding te vereis om ooreenstem, en implementeer 'n relaksie daarvan deur die Informasie Bottleneck metode. Ons toegang inkorpreer 'n teëstandige term in MT-oefening om voorstellings te leer wat so veel inligting oor die verwysing vertaling as moontlik kodeer, terwyl so klein inligting oor die invoer as moontlik hou. Parafrase kan genereer word deur te dekodeer terug na die bron van hierdie voorstelling, sonder om pivot vertalings te genereer. In addition to being more principled and efficient than round trip MT, our approach offers an adjustable parameter to control the fidelity-diversity trade-off, and obtains better results in our experiments.", 'am': 'የመስኮት ትርጓሜ (MT) ለፓርላፊል ትውልድ የተፈጸመ ምርጫ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ይህንን ሥርዓት የተደረገውን የብጤት ሥራ እናሳውቃለን፣ እናም አንዲት ትርጓሜን ለማሳየት የማይታወቀው የፓራphrase ዓይነቶች እናስፈራራለን፡፡ እነዚህን አስተያየት በመሠረት፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ የሚያጎድለውን የመተርጓሚውን ትርጓሜ በሙሉ ለመተካኘት እና በመጠቀም በተለይ የቦትሎንneck ሥርዓት እናሳርጋለን፡፡ Our approach incorporates an adversarial term into MT training in order to learn representations that encode as much information about the reference translation as possible, while keeping as little information about the input as possible.  ከዚህም መልዕክት ወደ ክፍል በመመለስ ፋራፕራሲዎች መፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ በዙሪያው ከመጓዛት ይልቅ አካባቢ እና ፍሬያዊ ከመሆን በቀር፣ የእምነታችንን የልዩ ልዩነት ንግድ መግለጫ ለመቆጣጠር እና የፍሬዎቻችንን ፍሬዎች በመሻል ማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Ýörän gezek Maşynyň terjimesini (MT) parafraz döredilmesi üçin meşhur saýlamadyr. Bu paralel korpora gözetlemek üçin ýeterlik edip bilýär. Bu kagyzda, biz bu ýagdaýda netijeli meňzeşlikli fonksiýany formalýarys we parafraz däldigini bir terjime paýlaşyp beren çiftlere mümkin däldir. Bu düşünjelerine daýan ýar, biz bu meseleyi küçürtýän başga bir metrik tasarlaýar we bütin terjime paýlaşmagyny eşitmäge gerek we munyň rahatlamasyny Information Bottleneck yöntemi bilen guruldyrys. Biziň ýaryşymyz MT bilimi bilen täsirli terjime edip, terjime hakynda mümkin edip kiçi bilgi bolup bilmek üçin çykyşlary öwrenmek üçin täsirli terjime terjime edilýär. _BAR_ Türek gezelenjiz MT-den has prinsipli we etkinlik bolmagynyň üstünde, biziň ýaryşymyz fidelit-çeşitli wajyplygyny kontrol etmek üçin düzelebilir bir parameter töreýär we biziň deneylerimizde has gowy netijelerimiz bar.', 'az': 'Seyahat Makinelərin Tercüməsi (MT) parafraz nəsillərinin məşhur seçimləridir. Bu, gözləmə üçün asanlıqla faydalanır paralel korpora. Bu kağızda, bu tərzdə təşkil edilmiş imkansız similarlıq funksiyasını formalizə edirik və bu, parafraz olmayan çiftlərə yalnız müəyyən bir çeviri paylaşır. Bu fikirlərə baxmayaraq, bu məsələni küçültmək üçün bütün tercümə dağıtımın uyğunlaşmasını tələb edərək alternatif bir metrik tasarlayırıq və onu Information Bottleneck metodu vasitəsilə istifadə edirik. Yaxınlığımız MT təhsil edilməsi üçün mümkün olduğu qədər dəyişiklik dəyişiklikləri öyrənmək üçün qarşılıqlı termini MT təhsil edir, lakin giriş haqqında mümkün olduğu qədər az bilgi saxlayaraq. Parafrazlər pivot tercümələrini yaratmadan, bu göstəricisindən qayıtmaq üçün yaradıla bilər. Törətli səfərdə MT-dən daha çox prinsipli və etkili olmaq üçün, bizim tərəfimiz fidelit-çeşitli ticarətlərini kontrol etmək üçün müəyyən edilə bilən bir parametr təklif edir və bizim experimentlərimizdə daha yaxşı sonuçlar alır.', 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রেস প্রজন্মের জন্য একটি জনপ্রিয় পছন্দ, যা সহজে প্যারালেল কোর্পোরা পর্যবেক্ষণের জন্য প্রাপ্ত। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই প্রযুক্তি দ্বারা প্রযুক্তির একই ধরনের প্রতিক্রিয়া ফাংশন গঠন করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে প্যারাফ্রেসের জোড়া বিভিন্ন অনুবা এই দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির ভিত্তিতে আমরা একটি বিকল্প মিট্রিক ডিজাইন করি যা এই বিষয়টিকে মিলিয়ে দেয়ার জন্য পুরো অনুবাদ বিতরণের প্রয়োজন এবং তথ্য বোটলাইনের মাধ্যমে  আমাদের প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখার জন্য এমটি প্রশিক্ষণের মধ্যে বিরোধী শব্দের মধ্যে একটি বিরোধী মাধ্যমে লিখেছে, যেখানে যে প্রতি এই প্রতিনিধিত্ব থেকে প্রতিনিধিত্বের সূত্রের কাছে প্যারাফ্রাস তৈরি করা যাবে, পিভোট অনুবাদ তৈরি করা ছাড়া। এমটির রাউন্ড পর্যটনের চেয়ে বেশী নেতৃত্ব এবং কার্যকর হওয়ার ছাড়াও আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া বিশ্বাস-বৈচিত্র্যময় ব্যবসা নিয়ন্ত্রণের জন্য একটি সংশোধনী', 'bs': 'Prevod strojeva okruženog putovanja (MT) je popularan izbor za generaciju parafraza, koji utiče na lako dostupnu paralelnu korporu za nadzor. U ovom papiru formaliziramo implicitnu funkciju sličnosti induciranu ovim pristupom i pokazujemo da je osjetljiv na parove koji nisu parafraze dijele jednog dvosmislenog prevoda. Na temelju tih uvida, mi dizajniramo alternativnu metriku sličnosti koja smanjuje ovaj problem zahtevajući cijelu distribuciju prevoda da se poklapa i provodimo opuštenje toga putem metode informacionih bočica. Naš pristup uključuje neprijateljski term in u obuku MT-a kako bi naučili predstave koje kodiraju najviše informacija o prevodu referencije što je moguće, dok držimo najmanje informacije o ulazu. Parafraze se mogu stvoriti dekodiranjem natrag na izvor iz ovog predstavljanja, a da ne proizvedem prevode pivota. Osim toga da budemo glavniji i učinkovitiji od MT-a na krug putovanja, naš pristup nudi prilagodljiv parameter za kontrolu trgovine vjernosti i raznolikosti i dobije bolji rezultat u našim eksperimentima.', 'hy': 'Աշխարհային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (ՄԹ) պարաֆրեզի սերունդի հանրահայտ ընտրությունն է, որը օգտագործում է հեշտությամբ հասանելի զուգահեռ կոպորան վերահսկելու համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կազմակերպում ենք այս մոտեցման միջոցով առաջացված ենթարկված նմանության ֆունկցիան և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այն խոցելի է ոչ պարաֆրեզիայի զույգերին, որոնք կիսում են մեկ երկիմաստ թարգմանություն: Հաշվի առնելով այս ընկալումների վրա, մենք ստեղծում ենք այլընտրանքային նմանության մետրիկ, որը նվազեցնում է այս խնդիրը, պահանջելով, որ ամբողջ թարգմանման տարածումը համապատասխանի, և կիրառելով այն հանգստացման միջոցով տեղեկատվական Bottlethro Մեր մոտեցումը ներառում է հակառակ տերմին MT-ի ուսումնասիրության մեջ, որպեսզի սովորենք ներկայացումներ, որոնք կոդավորում են հնարավորինս շատ տեղեկատվություն հաղորդակցման թարգմանության մասին, մինչդեռ հնարավորինս քիչ տեղեկատվություն պահպա Փարաֆրեսները կարող են ստեղծվել վերադառնալով աղբյուրին այս ներկայացումից, առանց պտտվող թարգմանությունների ստեղծելու: Մեր մոտեցումը առավել սկզբունքային և արդյունավետ է, քան շրջանակային ՄԹ-ը, առաջարկում է հարմարավորվող պարամետր, որպեսզի վերահսկենք հավատարիմ-բազմազանության առևտուրը և ավելի լավ արդյունք ստանանք մեր փորձարկումներում:', 'ca': "La traducció Round-trip Machine (MT) és una elecció popular per la generació de parafrases, que aprofita corpora paral·lela fàcilment disponible per supervisió. En aquest paper, formalitzem la funció implícita de similitud induïda per aquest enfocament, i demostrem que és susceptible a parelles sense parafrases compartint una sola traducció ambigua. Sobre la base d'aquestes idees, dissenyem una mètrica alternativa de similitud que mitigueix aquest problema exigint que tota la distribució de traducció coincidi, i implementem una relaxació a través del mètode Information Bottleneck. Our approach incorporates an adversarial term into MT training in order to learn representations that encode as much information about the reference translation as possible, while keeping as little information about the input as possible.  Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation, without having to generate pivot translations.  A més de ser més principiosa i eficient que el MT de viatge redond, el nostre enfocament ofereix un paràmetre ajustador per controlar el compromís entre la fidelitat i la diversitat, i obté millors resultats en els nostres experiments.", 'cs': 'Strojový překlad (MT) je oblíbenou volbou pro generování parafráz, která využívá snadno dostupné paralelní korpusy pro dohled. V tomto článku formalizujeme implicitní podobnostní funkci vyvolanou tímto přístupem a ukazujeme, že je náchylná k neparafrázovým párům sdílejícím jeden nejednoznačný překlad. Na základě těchto poznatků navrhujeme alternativní metriku podobnosti, která zmírňuje tento problém tím, že vyžaduje, aby celá distribuce překladu odpovídala, a implementujeme její uvolnění pomocí metody Information Bottleneck. Náš přístup zahrnuje do výcviku MT adversariální termín, abychom se naučili reprezentace, které kódují co nejvíce informací o referenčním překladu, přičemž zachovávají co nejméně informací o vstupu. Parafráze lze generovat dekódováním zpět do zdroje z této reprezentace, aniž byste museli generovat pivotové překlady. Kromě toho, že je náš přístup principiálnější a efektivnější než zpětná MT, nabízí náš přístup nastavitelný parametr pro kontrolu kompromisu věrnosti a diverzity a dosahuje lepších výsledků v našich experimentech.', 'et': 'Edasi-tagasi masintõlge (MT) on populaarne valik parafraaside genereerimiseks, mis kasutab kergesti kättesaadavaid paralleelkorporeid järelevalveks. Käesolevas töös formaliseerime kaudse sarnasuse funktsiooni, mis on indutseeritud selle lähenemisviisi, ja näitame, et see on vastuvõtlik mitteparafraaside paaridele, mis jagavad ühte ebamääraset tõlget. Nende teadmiste põhjal töötame välja alternatiivse sarnasuse mõõdiku, mis leevendab seda probleemi, nõudes, et kogu tõlke jaotus sobiks, ja rakendame selle leevendamist Info Bottlekaela meetodi abil. Meie lähenemisviis sisaldab MT koolitusse vastastikust terminit, et õppida esitusi, mis kodeerivad võimalikult palju teavet viitetõlke kohta, säilitades samas võimalikult vähe teavet sisendi kohta. Parafraase saab genereerida dekodeerides tagasi allikasse sellest esitusest, ilma et peaks genereerima pivot tõlkeid. Lisaks sellele, et meie lähenemisviis on põhimõttelisem ja tõhusam kui edasi-tagasi-tagasi MT, pakub meie lähenemisviis reguleeritavat parameetrit usaldusväärsuse ja mitmekesisuse kompromisse kontrollimiseks ning saavutab meie katsetes paremaid tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Round-trip Machine Translation (MT) on suosittu valinta parafraasien tuottamiseen, joka hyödyntää helposti saatavilla olevia rinnakkaisia korpusia valvontaan. Tässä artikkelissa formalisoimme implisiittisen samankaltaisuuden funktion, jota tämä lähestymistapa aiheuttaa, ja osoitamme, että se on altis ei-parafraasipareille, jotka jakavat yhden epäselvän käännöksen. Näiden oivallusten pohjalta suunnittelemme vaihtoehtoisen samankaltaisuusmittarin, joka lieventää tätä ongelmaa vaatimalla koko käännösjakson täsmäämistä, ja toteutamme sen rentoutumisen tietopullonkaula-menetelmällä. Lähestymistapamme sisältää kontradikaalin termin MT-koulutukseen, jotta oppisimme esityksiä, jotka koodaavat mahdollisimman paljon tietoa referenssikäännöksestä, säilyttäen mahdollisimman vähän tietoa syötteestä. Parafraaseja voidaan luoda purkamalla takaisin lähteeseen tästä esityksestä, ilman että sinun tarvitsee luoda pivot käännöksiä. Sen lisäksi, että toimintamme on periaatteellisempi ja tehokkaampi kuin meno-paluu MT, se tarjoaa säädettävän parametrin uskollisuuden ja monimuotoisuuden välisen kompromissin hallitsemiseksi ja tuottaa parempia tuloksia kokeiluissamme.', 'ha': "Tsarin Fassari na Kifin (MT) shi ne wata umare wa zaɓen wa kizabur na fassarar, wanda ke iya amfani da sauƙin haɗi da matsayin parallel Corpo wa tsaro. In a cikin wannan takardan, za mu fara wani abu da ke iya daidaita da shi wanda aka fara na wannan hanyarwa, kuma Mu nuna cewa shi mai shakka ne ga shari nau'in biyu wanda ba'a faɗa ba. Basan da masu gani, za'a ƙayyade wani metric dabam-dabar, wanda ke ƙari wannan masu so da yana nufin rabon fassarar da tarjifani duk su yi daidai, kuma za'a yi saka da shi a bayan shirin Shirin Mutum Bottlnake. Tsarakanmu na shigar da wata maganar motsi zuwa ma'abũcin MT dõmin ya sanar da wakilai waɗanda ke kodi da so many information about translation za'urar fassarar kamar tsakanin, kuma idan yana adana ƙari information about input an da ke iya amfani da shi. @ info: whatsthis Babu da ya kasance mafi kangara da mai kyau daga tafiyar MT, hanyoyinmu yana da wata parameter mai daidaita dõmin ya kange shawarar-da-dabar-dabam-dabam, kuma yana sãmu mafi alhẽri matsayi a cikin jarrabananmu.", 'he': 'מכונת נסיעה מסביבה (MT) היא בחירה פופולרית לדור פראפרזים, אשר משתמש בקלות בתורה קבועה זמינה לפיקוח. בעיתון הזה, אנו פורמלים את הפונקציה הדומה המתוקפת על ידי הגישה הזו, ולהראות שהיא רגישה לזוגים לא-פראפרזיות שחולקים תרגום משותף. בהתבסס על ההבנות האלה, אנחנו מעצבים מטריקה של דמיון אלטרנטיבית שמקלה את הנושא הזה על ידי דרישה לכל פיצוץ התרגום כדי להתאים, ולהפעיל את הירגעה שלו דרך שיטת המידע בקבוק צוואר. הגישה שלנו מכילה מונח נוגדי לאימון MT כדי ללמוד מייצגים שמקודים כמה שיותר מידע על התרגום התייחסות ככל האפשר, בזמן שמשמירה מידע קטן ככל האפשר על הכניסה. פראפרסמות יכולות ליצור על ידי פיקוד חזרה למקור מהייצוג הזה, מבלי ליצור תרגומות פיוטות. בנוסף להיות עקרונות ויעילות יותר מאשר MT טיול מסיבוב, הגישה שלנו מציעה פרמטר מתאים לשלוט במסחר הגוון-נאמנות, ולהשיג תוצאות טובות יותר בניסויים שלנו.', 'sk': 'Strojno prevajanje povratnih poti (MT) je priljubljena izbira za generiranje parafraz, ki izkorišča hitro dostopne vzporedne korpuse za nadzor. V prispevku formaliziramo funkcijo implicitne podobnosti, ki jo povzroča ta pristop, in pokažemo, da je dovzetna za neparafrazne pare, ki delijo en dvoumen prevod. Na podlagi teh vpogledov oblikujemo alternativno meritev podobnosti, ki ublaži to težavo tako, da zahteva, da se celotna distribucija prevodov ujema, in jo sprostimo z metodo Information Bottleneck. Naš pristop vključuje kontradiktorski izraz v MT usposabljanje, da bi se naučili reprezentacij, ki kodirajo čim več informacij o referenčnem prevodu, hkrati pa ohranjajo čim manj informacij o vnosu. Parafraze je mogoče ustvariti z dekodiranjem nazaj v vir iz te predstavitve, ne da bi bilo treba ustvariti pivot prevode. Poleg tega, da je načelnejši in učinkovitejši od povratnih terenov, naš pristop ponuja prilagodljiv parameter za nadzor kompromisa zvestobe in raznolikosti ter dosega boljše rezultate v naših eksperimentih.', 'jv': 'Global bending Nang pepulan iki, kita hukum nggawe kelas aplikasi ingkang sampeyan ingkang dipunanggunaké iki dadi, lan unyané wong kuwi wis ngerasakno kanggo kowe pasar-pasar iki sampeyan ingkang dipunanggunaké terjamahan sing apik. Ngawe nguasai pangunahing iki ulih, kita nguasai perusahaan sampeyan Alternate Metric sing nggawe sak ono buku nggawe ngilangno sistêm kanggo nyelehake tarjamahan kanggo nggawe, lan nguasai sak terus nggawe ngetik bebasan manut lan sak informasi bottelnek method . Rasané awakdhéwé éntuk karo pergambar sing nêmên tanggal nggawe MT karo aturan sing berarti basa gambar nggawe gerangkat informasi tambah karo pergambar terjamahan kanggo ngelaran, sampeyan katimbang kelangan informasi sing berarti input iso nggawe. spoken punctuation MT dadi ono sing paling apik dadi kapan mulalah dumadhi Lan MT, dadi diangkat dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo nguasai perusahaan-perusahaan karo hal-karang yo ngono nggawe gerakan sing luwih dumadhi', 'bo': 'འགྲུལ་བཞུད་གྱི་མ་འཁོར་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ལ(MT)ནི་ཆེས་མཁན་གྱི་གདམ་ཁ་ཚུལ་ཞིག་རེད། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཕར་རིས་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཡིན་གཟུགས་རིས་མེད་པའི་ཚིག Based on these insights, we design an alternative similarity metric that mitigates this issue by requiring the entire translation distribution to match, and implement a relaxation of it through the Information Bottleneck method. Our approach incorporates an adversarial term in to MT training in order to learn representations that encode as much information about the reference translation as possible, while keeping as little information about the input as possible. Paraphrases can be generated by decoding back to the source from this representation, without having to generate pivot translations. In addition to being more principled and efficient than round-trip MT, our approach offers an adjustable parameter to control the fidelity-diversity trade-off, and obtains better results in our experiments.'}
{'en': 'Challenges and Strategies in Cross-Cultural ', 'ar': 'GlobalWoZ: عولمة MultiWoZ لتطوير أنظمة حوار متعددة اللغات ذات مهام المنحى', 'es': 'GlobalWoz: Globalización de MultiWoz para desarrollar sistemas de diálogo multilingües orientados a tareas', 'pt': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizando o MultiWoZ para desenvolver sistemas de diálogo orientados a tarefas multilíngues', 'fr': 'GlobalWOZ\xa0: Mondialiser MultiWOZ pour développer des systèmes de dialogue multilingues orientés tâches', 'ja': 'GlobalWoZ ：多言語タスク指向の対話システムを開発するためのMultiWoZのグローバル化', 'hi': 'GlobalWoZ: बहुभाषी कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणालियों को विकसित करने के लिए बहु-WoZ का वैश्वीकरण', 'zh': 'GlobalWoZ:全球化多重性,多言', 'ru': 'GlobalWoZ: Глобализация MultiWoZ для разработки многоязычных систем диалога, ориентированных на решение конкретных задач', 'ga': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ a Dhomhandú chun Córais Idirphlé Ilteangacha atá Dírithe ar Thasc a Fhorbairt', 'el': 'GlobalWoZ: Παγκοσμιοποίηση του MultiWoZ για την ανάπτυξη πολυγλωσσικών συστημάτων διαλόγου προσανατολισμένων στα καθήκοντα', 'hu': 'GlobalWoZ: A MultiWoZ globalizálása többnyelvű feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerek fejlesztése érdekében', 'ka': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ გლობალიზაცია მრავალური დავალების განვითარება დიალოგური სისტემები', 'it': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizzare MultiWoZ per sviluppare sistemi di dialogo multilingue orientati alle attività', 'kk': 'ГлобалWoZ: Көп тілді тапсырмалар бағытталған диалог жүйелерін жасау үшін көп- WoZ глобализациялау', 'lt': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizing MultiWoZ to develop Multilingual Task-oriented Dialogue Systems', 'mk': 'ГлобалWoZ: Глобализирање на мултиWoZ за развој на мултијазички дијалошки системи ориентирани на задачи', 'ms': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizing MultiWoZ to Develop Multilingual Task-Oriented Dialog Systems', 'mt': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizing MultiWoZ to Develop Multilingual Task-Oriented Dialogue Systems', 'ml': 'ഗ്ലോബാള്\u200dവോസ്: പല ഭാഷകളുടെ ടാസ്ക്- മൂല്ലിഭാഷക്കുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mn': 'GlobalWoZ: Олон хэлний ажлын ориентиролтын диалог системүүдийг хөгжүүлэхэд', 'no': 'GlobalWoZ: Globaliserer fleirWoZ for å utvikla dialogsystemar med fleirspråk orientert oppgåver', 'pl': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizacja MultiWoZ w celu opracowania wielojęzycznych systemów dialogu zorientowanego na zadania', 'ro': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizarea MultiWoZ pentru a dezvolta sisteme de dialog multilingve orientate spre sarcini', 'sr': 'GlobalWoZ: Globaliziranje multiWoZ za razvoj sistema razvijanja višejezičkih dijaloga s orijentacijom zadataka', 'so': 'GlobalWoZ: GlobalWoZ: Globalizing MultiWoZ to Develop Task-oriented Dialog Systems', 'si': 'GlobalWoZ: ගොලෝබික විශ්වාස කරන්න MultiWoZ ගොලෝබික විශ්වාස කරන්න බොහොම භාෂාත්මක විකාසය කරන්න', 'sv': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalisera MultiWoZ för att utveckla flerspråkiga uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystem', 'ta': 'GlobalWoZ: பல மொழிகள் பணி திட்டமைக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளை உருவாக்குதலுக்கு பல வுஜிஸ் முழுமையாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ کو گلوبلائز کرتا ہے multilingual Task-Oriented Dialog Systems', 'vi': 'Tổ chức giải pháp vĩ đại', 'uz': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ muloqat vazifani taʼminlovchi muloqat tizimi', 'bg': 'Глобализиране на мултиWoZ за разработване на многоезични системи за диалог, ориентирани към задачите', 'nl': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ globaliseren om meertalige taakgerichte dialoogsystemen te ontwikkelen', 'da': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalisering af MultiWoZ til at udvikle flersprogede opgaveorienterede dialogsystemer', 'hr': 'GlobalWoZ: Globaliziranje multiWoZ za razvoj sustava razvijanja višejezičkih dijaloga s orijentacijom zadataka', 'id': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizing MultiWoZ to Develop Multilingual Task-Oriented Dialogue Systems', 'de': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalisierung von MultiWoZ zur Entwicklung mehrsprachiger aufgabenorientierter Dialogsysteme', 'sw': 'GlobalWoZ: Kutangaza MultiWoZ kuendeleza Mifumo ya Tamko za Kilugha zilizotengenezwa', 'tr': 'GlobalWoZ: 횉oklu dilli Ta첵챌a-G체챌li Dialog Sistemlerini geli힊tirmek i챌in 챌oklu WoZ Globalizing MultiWoZ', 'ko': 'Global Woz: 멀티 언어 대화 시스템을 개발하여 멀티 언어 대화 시스템을 글로벌화합니다.', 'af': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalisering MultiWoZ om Multilingual Opdrag- Orienteerde Dialoog Systeme te ontwikkel', 'fa': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizing MultiWoZ for Developing Multilingual Task-Oriented Dialogs Systems', 'hy': 'Գլոբալ', 'bn': 'GlobalWoZ: বহুভাষার কাজের কাজ-অর্থিত ডায়ালগ সিস্টেম উন্নয়নের জন্য বিশ্লোবাস করা হচ্ছে', 'sq': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizing MultiWoZ to Develop Multilingual Task-Oriented Dialogue Systems', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'bs': 'GlobalWoZ: Globaliziranje multiWoZ za razvoj sistema dijaloga s orijentacijom višejezičkih zadataka', 'cs': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizace MultiWoZ za účelem vývoje vícejazyčných dialogových systémů orientovaných na úkoly', 'az': 'GlobalWoZ: Multilingual Task-Oriented Dialoog Sistemlərini Gelişdirmək üçün MultiWoZ Globalizing MultiWoZ', 'et': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ globaliseerumine mitmekeelsete ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogisüsteemide väljatöötamiseks', 'ca': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalitzar MultiWoZ per desenvolupar sistemes de diàleg multilingües orientats a les tasques', 'fi': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ globalisoituu monikielisten tehtĂ¤vĂ¤lĂ¤htĂ¶isten vuoropuhelujĂ¤rjestelmien kehittĂ¤miseksi', 'sk': 'GlobalWoZ: Globalizacija MultiWoZ za razvoj večjezičnih sistemov dialoga, usmerjenih v naloge', 'he': 'GlobalWoZ: MultiWoZ גלובליזציה כדי לפתח מערכות דיאלוג רבות שפויות ממוקדות משימות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Global WoZ: Global WoZ kanggo nggawe MultiWoZ kanggo nggawe Multilengkang task-Oriented Dialog Sistem', 'bo': 'GlobalWoZ: སྤྱི་ཚོགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྩིས་བློ་གཏད་ཆེ་བློ་གཏད་འདོན་པ་ལ་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་དང་Orientation Dialog System'}
{'en': 'Various efforts in the Natural Language Processing (NLP) community have been made to accommodate linguistic diversity and serve speakers of many different languages. However, it is important to acknowledge that speakers and the content they produce and require, vary not just by language, but also by culture. Although language and culture are tightly linked, there are important differences. Analogous to cross-lingual and multilingual NLP, cross-cultural and multicultural NLP considers these differences in order to better serve users of NLP systems. We propose a principled framework to frame these efforts, and survey existing and potential strategies.', 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, houve um movimento em direção à curadoria de dados para sistemas multilíngues de diálogo orientado a tarefas (ToD) que podem atender pessoas que falam diferentes idiomas. No entanto, os conjuntos de dados multilíngues existentes de ToD têm uma cobertura limitada de idiomas devido ao alto custo da curadoria de dados ou ignoram o fato de que as entidades de diálogo mal existem nos países que falam esses idiomas. Para lidar com essas limitações, apresentamos um novo método de curadoria de dados que gera GlobalWoZ --- um conjunto de dados ToD multilíngue em grande escala globalizado a partir de um conjunto de dados ToD em inglês para três casos de uso inexplorados de sistemas ToD multilíngues. Nosso método se baseia em traduzir modelos de diálogo e preenchê-los com entidades locais nos países de língua-alvo. Além disso, estendemos a cobertura de idiomas de destino para 20 idiomas. Lançaremos nosso conjunto de dados e um conjunto de linhas de base sólidas para incentivar a pesquisa em sistemas ToD multilíngues para casos de uso reais.', 'ar': 'على مدى السنوات القليلة الماضية ، كان هناك تحرك نحو تنظيم البيانات لأنظمة الحوار متعدد اللغات (ToD) التي يمكن أن تخدم الأشخاص الذين يتحدثون لغات مختلفة. ومع ذلك ، فإن مجموعات بيانات ToD الحالية متعددة اللغات إما لها تغطية محدودة للغات بسبب التكلفة العالية لمعالجة البيانات ، أو تتجاهل حقيقة أن كيانات الحوار بالكاد توجد في البلدان التي تتحدث هذه اللغات. لمعالجة هذه القيود ، قدمنا طريقة جديدة لتنظيم البيانات تنشئ GlobalWoZ - مجموعة بيانات ToD متعددة اللغات واسعة النطاق معولمة من مجموعة بيانات ToD الإنجليزية لثلاث حالات استخدام غير مستكشفة لأنظمة ToD متعددة اللغات. تعتمد طريقتنا على ترجمة قوالب الحوار وتعبئتها بالكيانات المحلية في البلدان ذات اللغة المستهدفة. إلى جانب ذلك ، قمنا بتوسيع تغطية اللغات المستهدفة إلى 20 لغة. سنصدر مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا ومجموعة من خطوط الأساس القوية لتشجيع البحث عن أنظمة ToD متعددة اللغات لحالات الاستخدام الحقيقي.', 'es': 'En los últimos años, se ha avanzado hacia la conservación de datos para sistemas de diálogo orientado a tareas (ToD) multilingües que pueden servir a personas que hablan diferentes idiomas. Sin embargo, los conjuntos de datos ToD multilingües existentes tienen una cobertura limitada de idiomas debido al alto costo de la conservación de datos, o ignoran el hecho de que las entidades de diálogo apenas existen en los países que hablan estos idiomas. Para hacer frente a estas limitaciones, presentamos un novedoso método de conservación de datos que genera GlobalWoz, un conjunto de datos ToD multilingüe a gran escala globalizado a partir de un conjunto de datos ToD en inglés para tres casos de uso inexplorados de sistemas ToD multilingües. Nuestro método se basa en traducir plantillas de diálogo y rellenarlas con entidades locales en los países del idioma de destino. Además, ampliamos la cobertura de los idiomas de destino a 20 idiomas. Publicaremos nuestro conjunto de datos y un conjunto de bases sólidas para fomentar la investigación sobre sistemas ToD multilingües para casos de uso reales.', 'fr': "Au cours des dernières années, il y a eu une évolution vers la conservation des données pour les systèmes de dialogue orienté sur les tâches (ToD) multilingues pouvant servir des personnes parlant différentes langues. Cependant, les ensembles de données TdD multilingues existants ont une couverture linguistique limitée en raison du coût élevé de la conservation des données, ou ignorent le fait que les entités de dialogue existent peu dans les pays parlant ces langues. Pour pallier ces limites, nous introduisons une nouvelle méthode de conservation des données qui génère GlobalWoz, un jeu de données ToD multilingue à grande échelle globalisé à partir d'un jeu de données ToD anglais pour trois cas d'utilisation inexplorés de systèmes de ToD multilingues. Notre méthode est basée sur la traduction de modèles de dialogue et leur remplissage avec des entités locales dans les pays de la langue cible. En outre, nous étendons la couverture des langues cibles à 20 langues. Nous publierons notre ensemble de données et un ensemble de bases de référence solides pour encourager la recherche sur les systèmes de TdD multilingues pour des cas d'utilisation réels.", 'ja': 'ここ数年、さまざまな言語を話す人々に役立つ多言語タスク指向対話（ ToD ）システムのためのデータキュレーションへの動きがありました。しかし、既存の多言語ToDデータセットは、データキュレーションのコストが高いために言語のカバレッジが限られているか、または対話エンティティがこれらの言語を話す国にほとんど存在しないという事実を無視しています。これらの限界に対処するために、私たちはGlobalWoZを生成する新しいデータキュレーション方法を導入しました。GlobalWoZは、英語のToDデータセットからグローバル化された大規模な多言語ToDデータセットで、多言語ToDシステムの3つの未調査のユースケースを生成します。当社の方法は、ダイアログテンプレートを翻訳し、ターゲット言語の国の現地のエンティティで埋めることに基づいています。さらに、対象言語のカバレッジを20言語に拡大しました。データセットと一連の強力なベースラインをリリースし、実際のユースケースのための多言語ToDシステムの研究を奨励します。', 'hi': 'पिछले कुछ वर्षों में, बहुभाषी कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद (टीओडी) प्रणालियों के लिए डेटा क्यूरेशन की दिशा में एक कदम उठाया गया है जो विभिन्न भाषाओं को बोलने वाले लोगों की सेवा कर सकते हैं। हालांकि, मौजूदा बहुभाषी टीओडी डेटासेट में या तो डेटा क्यूरेशन की उच्च लागत के कारण भाषाओं का सीमित कवरेज होता है, या इस तथ्य को अनदेखा किया जाता है कि इन भाषाओं को बोलने वाले देशों में संवाद संस्थाएं मुश्किल से मौजूद हैं। इन सीमाओं से निपटने के लिए, हम एक उपन्यास डेटा क्यूरेशन विधि पेश करते हैं जो GlobalWoZ को एक बड़े पैमाने पर बहुभाषी टीओडी डेटासेट के --- में उत्पन्न करता है जो बहुभाषी टीओडी सिस्टम के तीन अनपेक्षित उपयोग मामलों के लिए एक अंग्रेजी टीओडी डेटासेट से वैश्वीकृत होता है। हमारी विधि संवाद टेम्पलेट्स का अनुवाद करने और उन्हें लक्ष्य-भाषा देशों में स्थानीय संस्थाओं के साथ भरने पर आधारित है। इसके अलावा, हम 20 भाषाओं के लिए लक्षित भाषाओं के कवरेज का विस्तार करते हैं। हम वास्तविक उपयोग के मामलों के लिए बहुभाषी टीओडी सिस्टम पर शोध को प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए अपने डेटासेट और मजबूत बेसलाइन का एक सेट जारी करेंगे।', 'ru': 'За последние несколько лет наметился сдвиг в направлении сбора данных для многоязычных систем ориентированного на решение конкретных задач диалога (ToD), которые могут обслуживать людей, говорящих на различных языках. Однако существующие многоязычные наборы данных ToD либо имеют ограниченный охват языков из-за высокой стоимости обработки данных, либо игнорируют тот факт, что диалоговые структуры едва существуют в странах, говорящих на этих языках. Для устранения этих ограничений мы внедряем новый метод курирования данных, который генерирует GlobalWoZ --- крупномасштабный многоязычный набор данных ToD, глобализованный из английского набора данных ToD для трех неисследованных вариантов использования  многоязычных систем ToD. Наш метод основан на переводе шаблонов диалогов и заполнении их локальными сущностями в странах целевого языка. Кроме того, мы расширили охват целевых языков до 20 языков. Мы выпустим наш набор данных и набор надежных исходных данных для поощрения исследований по многоязычным системам ToD для реальных вариантов использования.', 'zh': '往数年中,多言事(ToD)系统之数据管理已变,当为异言者给事。 然则数据管理本高昂,今多言ToD数集或有限于言语之覆盖范围,或忽于用之国几无其实。 为此限者,引入一新数据管理法,当成GlobalWoZ---从英语ToD数集全球化大多语言ToD数集,施于三未发者多言ToD系统用例。 吾法基于译模板,并于语言国/填充本地实体。 此外,将的言语覆盖范围扩到20种语言。 将发吾数集和强基线,以劝用例言ToD统。', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas, tá bogadh i dtreo coimeád sonraí do chórais ilteangacha idirphlé tasc-dhírithe (TOD) ar féidir leo freastal ar dhaoine a labhraíonn teangacha éagsúla. Mar sin féin, tá clúdach teoranta teangacha ag tacair sonraí TOD ilteangacha atá ann cheana mar gheall ar an gcostas ard a bhaineann le coimeád sonraí, nó déanann neamhaird den fhíric gur ar éigean a bhíonn eintitis idirphlé i dtíortha ina labhraítear na teangacha sin. Chun dul i ngleic leis na teorainneacha seo, tugaimid isteach modh leasaithe sonraí nua a ghineann GlobalWoZ --- tacar sonraí ilteangach ToD ar scála mór domhandaithe ó thacar sonraí Béarla ToD do thrí chás úsáide neamh-iniúchta de chórais ilteangacha TD. Tá ár modh bunaithe ar theimpléid dialóige a aistriú agus iad a líonadh le haonáin áitiúla sna tíortha sprioctheanga. Ina theannta sin, leathnaímid clúdach na sprioctheanga go 20 teanga. Eiseoidh muid ár dtacar sonraí agus sraith bonnlínte láidre chun taighde a spreagadh ar chórais ilteangacha TD do chásanna úsáide fíor.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt néhány évben a többnyelvű feladatorientált párbeszéd (ToD) rendszerek adatgyűjtése irányába történt, amelyek különböző nyelveket beszélők számára képesek kiszolgálni. A meglévő, többnyelvű ToD-adatkészletek azonban vagy korlátozott nyelvű lefedettséggel rendelkeznek az adatkezelés magas költségei miatt, vagy figyelmen kívül hagyják azt a tényt, hogy a párbeszéd szervezetek alig léteznek ezeket a nyelveket beszélő országokban. Ezeknek a korlátozásoknak a leküzdése érdekében bevezetünk egy új adatkezelési módszert, amely létrehozza a GlobalWoZ --- egy nagyszabású, többnyelvű ToD adatkészletet, amely egy angol ToD adatkészletből globalizálódik, három, többnyelvű ToD rendszer feltáratlan felhasználási esetében. Módszerünk a párbeszédsablonok fordításán és a célnyelvű országok helyi szervezeteivel való kitöltésén alapul. Emellett a célnyelvek lefedettségét 20 nyelvre bővítjük. Adatkészletünket és egy sor erős alapkészletünket is kiadjuk, hogy ösztönözzük a többnyelvű ToD rendszerekkel kapcsolatos kutatásokat valós használati esetekben.', 'ka': 'ბოლო რამდენიმე წლის განმავლობაში მონაცემების კურაციაზე მოვლენა მრავალური დავალების დიალოგის (ToD) სისტემებისთვის, რომლებიც ადამიანებს განსხვავებული ენების საუბროს შე მაგრამ მრავალენგური ToD მონაცემების კურაციის უფრო დიალოგური კურაციის გამოსახულებლად, ან არ იგნონონონეთ ფაქტი, რომ დიალოგური ინტერტიები მხოლოდ არსებობს ამ ენების ქვე ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ეს ზომილებების შესახებ, რომელიც GlobalWoZ-ს შექმნის პრომენტი მონაცემების კურაციის მეტი, რომელიც დიდი მრავალური ToD მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცია გლობალურად ინგლისური ToD მონაც ჩვენი მეთოდი დიალოგის შაბლონებზე დაბაზიან და ისინი ლოკალური ინტერტიკებით მიზეზი ენის ქვეყნებში. დამატებით, ჩვენ მინიშვნელოვანი ენების კონფიგურაციას 20 ენაზე გავაზრუნეთ. ჩვენ ჩვენი მონაცემები და ძალიან ძალიან ბაზონული ხაზები გახსნა, რომ მრავალენგური ToD სისტემების გამოყენება რეალური გამოყენება.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια, σημειώθηκε μια κίνηση προς την κατεύθυνση της επιμέλειας δεδομένων για πολυγλωσσικά συστήματα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένου στις εργασίες που μπορούν να εξυπηρετήσουν άτομα που μιλούν διαφορετικές γλώσσες. Ωστόσο, τα υπάρχοντα πολύγλωσσα σύνολα δεδομένων ΤΔ είτε έχουν περιορισμένη κάλυψη γλωσσών λόγω του υψηλού κόστους επεξεργασίας δεδομένων, είτε αγνοούν το γεγονός ότι οντότητες διαλόγου ελάχιστα υπάρχουν σε χώρες που μιλούν αυτές τις γλώσσες. Για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των περιορισμών, εισάγουμε μια νέα μέθοδο επεξεργασίας δεδομένων που παράγει ένα μεγάλης κλίμακας πολύγλωσσο σύνολο δεδομένων που παγκοσμιοποιείται από ένα αγγλικό σύνολο δεδομένων για τρεις ανεξερεύνητες περιπτώσεις χρήσης πολυγλωσσικών συστημάτων. Η μέθοδος μας βασίζεται στη μετάφραση προτύπων διαλόγου και την πλήρωσή τους με τοπικές οντότητες στις χώρες-στόχους. Εξάλλου, επεκτείνουμε την κάλυψη των γλωσσών-στόχων σε είκοσι γλώσσες. Θα απελευθερώσουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων μας και ένα σύνολο ισχυρών βασικών γραμμών για να ενθαρρύνουμε την έρευνα σε πολυγλωσσικά συστήματα για πραγματικές περιπτώσεις χρήσης.', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni, si è passati alla cura dei dati per sistemi di dialogo multilingue orientato ai compiti (ToD) che possono servire persone che parlano lingue diverse. Tuttavia, i set di dati multilingui esistenti sulle ToD hanno una copertura limitata delle lingue a causa dell'elevato costo della gestione dei dati, o ignorano il fatto che le entità di dialogo esistono a malapena nei paesi che parlano queste lingue. Per affrontare queste limitazioni, introduciamo un nuovo metodo di cura dei dati che genera GlobalWoZ --- un set di dati ToD multilingue su larga scala globalizzato da un set di dati ToD inglese per tre casi d'uso inesplorati di sistemi ToD multilingue. Il nostro metodo si basa sulla traduzione di modelli di dialogo e sulla loro compilazione con entità locali nei paesi della lingua di destinazione. Inoltre, estendiamo la copertura delle lingue di destinazione a 20 lingue. Rilasceremo il nostro set di dati e una serie di solide linee di base per incoraggiare la ricerca su sistemi multilingue ToD per casi d'uso reali.", 'lt': 'Per pastaruosius kelerius metus buvo žengtas žingsnis duomenų tvarkymo link daugiakalbių į užduotis orientuotų dialogo sistemų, kurios gali tarnauti žmonėms, kalbantiems skirtingas kalbas. Tačiau esami daugiakalbiai ToD duomenų rinkiniai dėl didelių duomenų apdorojimo sąnaudų arba ignoruoja tai, kad šiomis kalbomis kalbančiose šalyse vos egzistuoja dialogo subjektai. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos apribojimus, įvedame naują duomenų tvarkymo metodą, kuris sukuria GlobalWoZ -- didelio masto daugiakalbį ToD duomenų rinkinį, globalizuotą iš anglų ToD duomenų rinkinio trims nenagrinėtiems daugiakalbių ToD sistemų naudojimo atvejams. Mūsų metodas grindžiamas dialogo šablonų vertimu ir jų užpildymu vietos subjektais tikslinės kalbos šalyse. Be to, mes išplečiame tikslinių kalbų aprėptį iki 20 kalbų. We will release our dataset and a set of strong baselines to encourage research on multilingual ToD systems for real use cases.', 'mk': 'Во текот на изминатите неколку години, постоеше потег кон курација на податоци за мултијазични дијалозирани системи (ToD) кои можат да служат на луѓето кои зборуваат различни јазици. Сепак, постојните мултијазични тоD податоци или имаат ограничено покривање на јазиците поради високите цени на корекцијата на податоците, или го игнорираат фактот дека ентитетите на дијалогот едвај постојат во земјите кои зборуваат овие јазици. За да ги решиме овие ограничувања, воведуваме нов метод за курација на податоци кој генерира ГлобалВуз -- голем мултијазичен тоD податок глобализиран од англиски тоD податок за три неиспитани случаи на употреба на „ мултијазични тоD системи“. Нашиот метод е базиран на преведување на шаблони за дијалог и исполнување на нив со локални ентитети во земјите на јазикот на целта. Освен тоа, го прошируваме покривањето на јазиците на мета на 20 јазици. Ќе ги објавиме нашите податоци и сет силни основни линии за охрабрување на истражувањето на мултијазичните тоD системи за вистински случаи на употреба.', 'kk': 'Соңғы бірнеше жылдар бойынша, көптілік тапсырмалар бағытталған диалог (ТоD) жүйелерінің деректер меңзеріне ауысу болды. Бірнеше тілдерді сөйлейтін адамдарға көмектесе алады. Бірақ бірнеше тілді ToD деректер жиындарында деректер меңзерінің жоғары мәселелерін шектелген тілдер бар немесе бұл тілдерді сөйлейтін елдерде диалог жағдайларын елемейді. Бұл шектерді шектеу үшін біз GlobalWoZ- ды жасайтын жаңа деректерді меңзету әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл үш тілді ToD деректер жинағынан жалғастырылған үлкен тілді ToD деректер жинағынан жасалған үлкен тілді ToD жүйелерін қолдану үшін Біздің әдіміміз диалог үлгілерін аударып, оларды мақсатты тілдер елдерінде жергілікті нысандармен толтыруға негізделген. Қосымша, біз мақсатты тілдерді 20 тілдерге аударамыз. Біз деректер қорларымызды және бірнеше негізгі жолдарды бірнеше тілді ToD жүйелерін зерттеу үшін шындық пайдалану үшін зерттеуді көмектесеміз.', 'ms': 'Over the last few years, there has been a move towards data curation for multilingual task-oriented dialogue (ToD) systems that can serve people speaking different languages.  However, existing multilingual ToD datasets either have a limited coverage of languages due to the high cost of data curation, or ignore the fact that dialogue entities barely exist in countries speaking these languages.  Untuk mengatasi keterangan-keterangan ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah penyerahan data yang baru yang menghasilkan GlobalWoZ -- set data ToD berbagai bahasa besar yang globalisasi dari set data ToD Inggeris untuk tiga kes penggunaan tidak dikenalpasti dari sistem ToD berbagai bahasa. Kaedah kami berdasarkan menerjemahkan templat dialog dan mengisi dengan entiti setempat di negara-bahasa sasaran. Selain itu, kita memperluas penutupan bahasa sasaran ke 20 bahasa. Kami akan melepaskan set data kami dan set garis dasar yang kuat untuk mendorong penyelidikan sistem ToD berbilang bahasa untuk kes penggunaan sebenar.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ കുറച്ച് വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d, പല ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ ജോലിക്കുള്ള സംവിധാനങ്ങള്\u200d എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള പല ഭാഷ ടോഡി ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഈ ഭാഷകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന രാജ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഭാഷകളുടെ  ഈ പരിധികളെ എതിര്\u200dത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഗ്ലോബാല്\u200dവോസ് സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ കറഷന്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d നാം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് ഗ്ലോബാല്\u200dവോസ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുകയും ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷ രാജ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d സ്ഥാനമാ Besides, we extend the coverage of target languages to 20 languages.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റും ബലമുള്ള ബേസ്ലെയിനുകളും പുറപ്പെടുത്തും... ...പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ടോഡി സിസ്റ്റമുകളില', 'mt': "Matul dawn l-a ħħar snin, kien hemm pass lejn il-kurazzjoni tad-dejta għal sistemi ta’ djalogu multilingwi orjentati lejn ix-xogħol (ToD) li jistgħu jservu lil nies li jitkellmu lingwi differenti. Madankollu, settijiet ta’ dejta eżistenti multilingwi ToD jew għandhom kopertura limitata ta’ lingwi minħabba l-ispiża għolja tal-kurazzjoni tad-dejta, jew jinjoraw il-fatt li entitajiet ta’ djalogu bilkemm jeżistu f’pajjiżi li jitkellmu dawn il-lingwi. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-limitazzjonijiet, a ħna nintroduċu metodu ġdid ta » kurazzjoni tad-dejta li jiġġenera GlobalWoZ --- sett ta » dejta multilingwi ToD fuq skala kbira globalizzat minn sett ta » dejta Ingliż ToD għal tliet każijiet ta » użu mhux esplorat ta » sistemi ToD multilingwi. Il-metodu tagħna huwa bbażat fuq it-traduzzjoni tal-mudelli tad-djalogu u l-mili tagħhom b’entitajiet lokali fil-pajjiżi fil-lingwa fil-mira. Barra minn hekk, jestendu l-kopertura tal-lingwi fil-mira għal 20 lingwa. Ser nirrilaxxaw is-sett tad-dejta tagħna u sett ta' linji bażi b'saħħithom biex inħeġġu r-riċerka dwar sistemi multilingwi ta' ToD għal każijiet ta' użu reali.", 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хэдэн жилийн хугацаанд олон хэлний даалгавартай диалог (ToD) системийн мэдээллийн хөгжлийн хөдөлгөөнд оролцсон. Гэхдээ олон хэлний ToD өгөгдлийн сангууд нь өгөгдлийн хөгжлийн үнэ цэнэтэй болохоор хэлний мэдээллийг хязгаарлагддаг, эсвэл улс орнуудад эдгээр хэлний яриаг хэлэхдээ хэт ч байхгүй байдгийг анзаарах юм. Эдгээр хязгаарлалуудыг зогсоохын тулд бид GlobalWoZ-г олон хэлний ToD өгөгдлийн санг англи ToD өгөгдлийн санаас дэлхийлэгдсэн гурван тайлбаргүй олон хэлний ToD системийн хэрэглээний тухай шинэ өгөгдлийн хөгжүүлэх аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний арга бол диалог шалгалтыг орлуулж, зорилготой хэлний орнуудын орон нутгийн байгууллагуудыг дүүргэж байгаа. Үүнээс гадна бид зориулагдсан хэл дээр 20 хэл хүртэл нэмэгдүүлнэ. Бид өгөгдлийн санг, үнэндээ хэрэглэгдэх тохиромжтой олон хэлний ToD системийн судалгааг дэмжихийн тулд хүчтэй суурь шугам гаргах болно.', 'pl': 'W ciągu ostatnich kilku lat nastąpiło przejście w kierunku kuracji danych dla wielojęzycznych systemów dialogu zorientowanego na zadania (ToD), które mogą służyć osobom posługującym się różnymi językami. Jednakże istniejące wielojęzyczne zbiory danych dotyczących ToD mają ograniczony zakres języków ze względu na wysokie koszty kuracji danych lub ignorują fakt, że podmioty dialogu ledwo istnieją w krajach posługujących się tymi językami. Aby rozwiązać te ograniczenia, wprowadzamy nową metodę kuracji danych, która generuje GlobalWoZ --- wielojęzyczny zestaw danych ToD zglobalizowany z angielskiego zbioru danych ToD dla trzech niezbadanych przypadków zastosowania wielojęzycznych systemów ToD. Nasza metoda opiera się na tłumaczeniu szablonów dialogu i wypełnianiu ich lokalnymi podmiotami w krajach języka docelowego. Poza tym rozszerzamy zakres języków docelowych na 20-języki. Udostępnimy nasz zestaw danych oraz zestaw silnych linii bazowych, aby zachęcić do badań nad wielojęzycznymi systemami ToD dla realnych przypadków użytku.', 'no': 'I løpet av dei siste få år har det oppstått ein trekk mot datakursing for fleirspråk oppgåveorientert dialogvindauge (ToD) som kan gjere folk som snakkar ulike språk. Det finst imidlertid fleirspråk ToD-dataset har enten ein begrenset omdekking av språk på grunn av høg kostnad for datakurering, eller ignorerer faktum at dialogeiningar berre finst i landene som snakkar desse språka. For å løse disse grensene, introduserer vi ein nytt datakursisjonsmetode som lager GlobalWoZ -- ein stor multispråk ToD- dataset globalisert frå ein engelsk ToD- dataset for tre utforska bruk av fleirspråk ToD- systemer. Metoden vårt er basert på omsetjingsmalar i dialogvindauget og fyller dei med lokale einingar i målsprakklandene. I tillegg utvidar vi omslaget av målspråk til 20 språk. Vi vil løysa datasettet våre og eit sett sterke baselinjer for å oppfordre forskning på fleirspråk ToD-systemet for verkeleg bruk.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani, s-a înregistrat o evoluție către prelucrarea datelor pentru sistemele de dialog multilingv orientat spre sarcini (ToD), care pot servi persoanele care vorbesc limbi diferite. Cu toate acestea, seturile de date multilingve existente privind dezvoltarea datelor fie au o acoperire limitată a limbilor din cauza costurilor ridicate ale prelucrării datelor, fie ignoră faptul că entitățile de dialog abia există în țările care vorbesc aceste limbi. Pentru a aborda aceste limitări, introducem o metodă nouă de prelucrare a datelor care generează GlobalWoZ --- un set de date ToD multilingv la scară largă globalizat dintr-un set de date ToD în limba engleză pentru trei cazuri neexplorate de utilizare a sistemelor ToD multilingve. Metoda noastră se bazează pe traducerea șabloanelor de dialog și completarea acestora cu entități locale din țările din limba țintă. În plus, extindem acoperirea limbilor ţintă la 20 de limbi. Vom lansa setul nostru de date și un set de linii de referință puternice pentru a încuraja cercetarea privind sistemele multilingve ToD pentru cazuri de utilizare reale.', 'sr': 'Tokom poslednjih nekoliko godina, postoji potez prema kuraciji podataka za sisteme dijaloga orijentiranog na višejezičkim zadacima (ToD) koji mogu služiti ljudima koji govore različite jezike. Međutim, postojeće multijezičke podatke o ToD-u ili imaju ograničeno pokrivanje jezika zbog visoke troškove kuracije podataka, ili ignorišu činjenicu da dijalogske entitate jedva postoje u zemljama koje govore ovim jezicima. Da bi se riješili ovim ograničenjima, predstavljamo novu metodu kuracije podataka koji stvara GlobalWoZ -- veliku multijezičku kompletu podataka za ToD globaliziranu iz kompleta podataka engleskog ToD za tri neobjašnjene korištenje slučajeva multijezičkih ToD sistema. Naša metoda je bazirana na prevodu šablona dijaloga i ispunjavanju ih lokalnim entitetima u zemljama ciljanog jezika. Osim toga, proširimo pokrivanje ciljnih jezika na 20 jezika. Oslobodićemo naš set podataka i skup jakih osnovnih linija za poticanje istraživanja o multijezičkim sistemima ToD-a za stvarne slučajeve upotrebe.', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu danbeeyey dhawr sano waxaa la socday dhaqdhaqaaqi xafiiska macluumaadka ee ku qoran diyaarinta shaqada luuqadaha kala duduwan (ToD) oo u adeegi kara dadka ku hadla luuqado kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, macluumaadyada ToD ee luuqadaha kala duduwan waxay leeyihiin qarsoodi aad u xadan luqadaha sababtoo ah kharashka qarsoodiga macluumaadka, ama ka jeedso xaqiiqda, in dawlada bulshada looga baahan yahay wadamada ku hadlaya afkan. Si a an u tacliino xaduudahaas, waxaan u soo bandhignaa qaab warqad macluumaad ah oo ka soo saara GlobalWoZ --- taas oo ah danbiyo badan oo luuqad kala duduwan oo kala duduwan ToD ah oo laga soo bandhigay macluumaadka afka Ingiriiska ToD ee saddex xaaladood oo aan la shaqeyn isticmaalka ‘ nidaamka ToD’. Metalkeenu waxay ku saleysan tahay turjumidda qoraalka islamarkaasna ay buuxinayaan alaabta deegaanka ee wadamada luqada loogu talagalay. Besides, we extend the coverage of target languages to 20 languages.  Waxaannu bixinaynaa taariikhdeena iyo heer caadi ah si aan u dhiirrigelino baaritaanka nidaamka ToD ee luuqadaha kala duduwan si ay u isticmaalaan xaaladaha runta ah.', 'sv': 'Under de senaste åren har det skett en utveckling mot datahantering för flerspråkiga uppgiftsorienterade dialogsystem (ToD) som kan betjäna människor som talar olika språk. De befintliga flerspråkiga datauppsättningarna har dock antingen begränsad språktäckning på grund av de höga kostnaderna för datahantering, eller ignorerar det faktum att dialogenheter knappt finns i länder som talar dessa språk. För att ta itu med dessa begränsningar introducerar vi en ny databehandlingsmetod som genererar GlobalWoZ --- en storskalig flerspråkig ToD-dataset globaliserad från en engelsk ToD-dataset för tre outforskade användningsfall av flerspråkiga ToD-system. Vår metod bygger på att översätta dialogmallar och fylla dem med lokala enheter i målspråksländerna. Dessutom utökar vi målspråkens täckning till 20 språk. Vi kommer att släppa vår dataset och en uppsättning starka baslinjer för att uppmuntra forskning om flerspråkiga ToD-system för verkliga användningsfall.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු කිහිපයක් පස්සේ, වෙනස් භාෂාවක් කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් මිනිස්සුන්ට සේවා කරන්න පුළුවන් දත්ත ක්\u200dරිය නමුත්, තියෙන්නේ බොහොම භාෂාවක් ToD දත්ත සැට් වලින් භාෂාවට සීමාවක් තියෙනවා නැත්නම් දත්ත ක්\u200dරියාවක් ගොඩක් විශාල විශ මේ සීමාව සටහන් කරන්න, අපි ලොකු දත්ත ක්\u200dරියාසිකරණ විධානයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා ඒක GlobalWoZ --- ලොකු විශාල භාෂාවක් ToD දත්ත සෙට් වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ToD දත්ත අපේ විධානය සංවාදය ටෙම්ප්ලේටල් වාර්ථා කරන්න සහ ස්ථානික භාෂාවයේ තියෙන ස්ථානික අයිතියෙන් ප ඒ වගේම, අපි ලක්ෂණ භාෂාවගේ ආවරණය 20 භාෂාවට වැඩ කරනවා. අපි අපේ දත්ත සූදානම් සහ ශක්තිමත් බේස්ලින් සූදානම් නිදහස් කරනවා ඇත්ත භාෂාවක් තොඩ් පද්ධතිය සඳහා අන', 'ta': 'கடந்த சில வருடங்களில், பல மொழி செயல் செலுத்தப்பட்ட உரையாடல் (ToD) அமைப்புகளுக்கு தகவல் திருப்புதலுக்கு ஒரு நகர்த்தல் ஏற்பட்டுள்ளது, அது  ஆனால், இருக்கும் பல மொழி டோடி தகவல் அமைப்புகள் இந்த மொழிகளை பேசும் நாடுகளில் உரையாடல் பொருட்கள் குறைவாகவே இருக்கிறது என்பதை புறக்கணிக்கவும். இந்த எல்லைகளை tackle, நாம் ஒரு புதிய தரவு திருத்த முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், அது GlobalWoZ --- ஒரு பெரிய அளவு பல மொழி டோடி தகவல் அமைப்பு மூன்று எதிர்பாராத பயன்படுத்தப்படாத மூன்று  Our method is based on translating dialogue templates and filling them with local entities in the target-language countries.  மேலும், நாம் இலக்கு மொழிகளை 20 மொழிகளுக்கு விரிவாக்குகிறோம். நாம் எங்கள் தரவுத்தளத்தை வெளியேற்றுவோம் மற்றும் ஒரு வலிமையான அடிப்படை கோடு', 'ur': 'گزشتہ چند سالوں میں، بہت سی زبان کی تابع کی سیستمات کے لئے ڈیٹ کورٹ کی طرف چل رہا ہے جو لوگوں کو مختلف زبان بولتے ہیں۔ لیکن موجود بہت سی زبان توڈ ڈاٹ سٹ ہیں یا ان زبانوں کی محدودیت کی حفاظت کرتی ہے، یا ان زبانوں میں جو ان زبانوں سے بولتے ہیں ان کی حقیقت کو غافل کر دیتے ہیں. یہ محدود کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے ایک نو ڈیٹا کریٹ کا طریقہ معلوم کرتا ہے جو GlobalWoZ کو پیدا کرتا ہے--- ایک بڑی نسبت بڑی زبان توD ڈیٹ سٹ جو انگلیسی ٹوڈ ڈیٹ سٹ سے گلوبل کیا گیا ہے تین بغیر منطقی استعمال کے مطابق بہت سی زبان توڈ ہمارا طریقہ ڈالیلوگ ٹیپلٹوں کو ترجمہ کرنا اور ان کو موجود زبان کشوروں میں محلی ایٹنیٹوں کے ساتھ بھرا رہا ہے. اور ہم نشانی زبانوں کی پورش 20 زبانوں تک پھیلاتے ہیں۔ ہم اپنے ڈاٹ سٹ اور ایک مجموعہ مضبوط بنسٹ لینوں کو روشن کریں گے کہ بہت سی زبان توڈ سیستموں پر واقعی استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Keyingi necha yil ichida, bir necha necha yil muloqon vazifa muloqat bilan muloqat muloqat oynasi (ToD) tizimlariga koʻchiriladi. Bu bir necha yil odamlarni boshqa tillar bilan gapiradigan tizimga ishlab chiqaradi. Ammo, mavjud muloqon ToD maʼlumotlar tarkibi maʼlumotlar tarkibi mavjud emas yoki maʼlumot qiymatining eng kichkina qismi sababchi boʻlgan tillar sohasini ko'rsatish mumkin, yoki bu tillarda gapiradigan muloqat maʼlumotlar faqat mavjud emas. Bu chegaralarni taklif qilish uchun biz GlobalWoZ - bir katta tildagi multili ToD maʼlumot tarkibini yaratish uchun eng tildagi ta'lim tugmalar tarkibi va uchta ishlatilmagan uchta foydalanuvchi tizimning uchta tili tizimi uchun. Bizning usuli dialog namunalarini tarjima qilish asosida, ularni lokal obʼektlar bilan toʻldirish. Ko'pchilik, biz qanday tilni 20 tillarda qarashmiz. Biz haqiqiqiy foydalanish uchun muloqat tili tizim tizimlariga qiziqarishni amalga oshirish uchun maxsus asboblar tugmalarimizni chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong những năm gần đây, có một bước tiến tới việc chuyển giao dữ liệu cho các hệ thống liên lạc các nhiệm vụ đa dạng (ToD) có thể phục vụ người nói ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, các tập tin đa dạng Toi D hiện nay có một mức độ giới hạn về ngôn ngữ do mức giá cao của việc xử lý dữ liệu, hoặc lờ đi sự thật là các thực thể đối thoại hầu như không tồn tại ở những quốc gia nói những ngôn ngữ này. Để giải quyết những giới hạn này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp xử lí dữ liệu mới tạo ra Global WoZ-- - một bộ dữ liệu phát triển ngôn ngữ đa dạng, toàn diện toàn diện từ một bộ dữ liệu ToD Anh quốc cho ba trường hợp không giải thích về sự sử dụng đa dạng. Phương pháp của chúng tôi dựa trên việc dịch mẫu cuộc đối thoại và điền đầy đủ các tổ chức địa phương ở các quốc gia ngôn ngữ đích. Thêm nữa, chúng ta sẽ mở rộng phạm vi ngôn ngữ mục tiêu đến chục ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi sẽ công bố dữ liệu của chúng tôi và một bộ cơ sở cơ bản vững chắc để thúc đẩy nghiên cứu về hệ thống Tod đa dạng cho trường hợp dùng thực.', 'da': 'I løbet af de sidste par år er der sket en bevægelse i retning af datakuration for flersprogede opgaveorienterede dialogsystemer (ToD), der kan betjene mennesker, der taler forskellige sprog. Eksisterende flersprogede ToD-datasæt har imidlertid enten begrænset sprogdækning på grund af de høje omkostninger ved databehandling, eller ignorerer, at dialogenheder knap nok findes i lande, der taler disse sprog. For at tackle disse begrænsninger introducerer vi en ny datakuratmetode, der genererer GlobalWoZ --- et stort flersproget ToD datasæt globaliseret fra et engelsk ToD datasæt til tre uudforskede brugstilfælde af flersprogede ToD systemer. Vores metode er baseret på at oversætte dialogskabeloner og udfylde dem med lokale enheder i målsprogslandene. Desuden udvider vi dækningen af målsprog til 20 sprog. Vi vil frigive vores datasæt og et sæt stærke basislinjer for at fremme forskning i flersprogede ToD-systemer til reelle brugssager.', 'hr': 'Tokom posljednjih nekoliko godina, postoji potez prema usmjerenju podataka za sisteme dijaloga orijentiranog na višejezičkim zadatkama (ToD) koji mogu služiti ljudima koji govore različite jezike. Međutim, postojeći multijezički podaci o ToD-u ili imaju ograničeni pokrivač jezika zbog visoke troškove kuracije podataka, ili ignoriraju činjenicu da dijalogske subjekte jedva postoje u zemljama koje govore ovim jezicima. Za rješavanje tih ograničenja, predstavljamo novu metodu korištenja podataka koji stvara GlobalWoZ -- veliku višejezičku kompletu podataka za ToD globaliziranu iz kompleta podataka engleskog ToD-a za tri neobjašnjene korištenje slučajeva višejezičkih ToD-a. Naša metoda je temeljena na prevodu šablona dijaloga i ispunjavanju ih lokalnim entitetima u zemljama ciljnog jezika. Osim toga, proširimo pokrivanje ciljnih jezika na 20 jezika. Oslobodit ćemo naš set podataka i skup jakih osnovnih linija za poticanje istraživanja o multijezičkim sustavima ToD-a za stvarne slučajeve upotrebe.', 'bg': 'През последните няколко години е настъпил напредък към събиране на данни за многоезични системи за диалог, ориентиран към задачите, които могат да обслужват хора, говорещи различни езици. Съществуващите многоезични набори от данни за ДО обаче или имат ограничено покритие на езиците поради високата цена на събирането на данни, или пренебрегват факта, че структурите за диалог едва съществуват в държавите, говорещи тези езици. За да се справим с тези ограничения, въвеждаме нов метод за коригиране на данни, който генерира мащабен многоезичен набор от данни, глобализиран от английски набор от данни за три неизследвани случая на употреба на многоезични системи. Методът ни се основава на превод на шаблони за диалог и попълване им с местни субекти в страните на целевия език. Освен това разширяваме обхвата на целевите езици на 20 езика. Ние ще публикуваме нашия набор от данни и набор от силни базови линии, за да насърчим изследванията на многоезичните системи за обучение за реални случаи на употреба.', 'nl': 'De afgelopen jaren is er een stap naar datacuratie voor meertalige task-oriented dialogsystemen (ToD) die mensen die verschillende talen spreken, kunnen bedienen. Bestaande meertalige ToD-datasets hebben echter een beperkte dekking van talen vanwege de hoge kosten van gegevenscuratie, of negeren het feit dat dialoogentiteiten nauwelijks bestaan in landen die deze talen spreken. Om deze beperkingen aan te pakken, introduceren we een nieuwe data curation methode die GlobalWoZ --- genereert een grootschalige meertalige ToD dataset geglobaliseerd uit een Engelse ToD dataset voor drie onontdekte use cases van meertalige ToD systemen. Onze methode is gebaseerd op het vertalen van dialogsjablonen en het vullen ervan met lokale entiteiten in de doeltaallanden. Daarnaast breiden we de dekking van doeltalen uit naar 20-talen. We zullen onze dataset en een reeks sterke basislijnen vrijgeven om onderzoek naar meertalige ToD-systemen voor echte use cases aan te moedigen.', 'ko': '지난 몇 년 동안 다중 언어 임무 가이드 대화(ToD) 시스템의 데이터 정리가 트렌드였는데, 이 시스템은 서로 다른 언어를 말하는 사람에게 서비스를 제공할 수 있다.그러나 기존의 다중 언어인 Tod 데이터 세트는 데이터 정리의 높은 비용으로 인해 언어의 범위가 제한되거나 이러한 언어를 사용하는 국가에 대화 실체가 거의 존재하지 않는다는 사실을 무시했다.이러한 한계를 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 데이터 정리 방법을 도입하여 글로벌 WoZ-영어 Tod 데이터 집합에서 글로벌화된 대규모 다언어 Tod 데이터 집합을 생성했다. 다언어 Tod 시스템의 세 가지 미개발 용례에 사용된다.우리의 방법은 번역 대화 템플릿을 바탕으로 목표 언어 국가의 현지 실체로 그것들을 채운다.그 밖에 우리는 목표 언어의 범위를 20개 언어로 확대할 것이다.우리는 실제 용례에 대한 다중 언어 ToD 시스템에 대한 연구를 장려하기 위해 우리의 데이터 집합과 강력한 기선을 발표할 것이다.', 'fa': 'در طول چند سال گذشته، یک حرکت به سمت مرحله داده\u200cها برای سیستم\u200cهای مطالعه\u200cای که می\u200cتوانند به مردم خدمت کنند که زبان\u200cهای مختلف صحبت کنند. با این حال، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ToD زیادی زبان\u200cها یا زبان\u200cهای محدودیت دارند به دلیل هزینه\u200cهای زیادی از کورش داده\u200cها، یا حقیقت را نادیده بگیرند که مجموعه\u200cهای گفتگو در کشورها سخت در این زبانها وجود دارند. برای حل این محدودیت، ما یک روش کنترل داده های نو را معرفی می کنیم که GlobalWoZ را تولید می کند -- یک مجموعه داده های زیادی زبان ToD globalized از یک مجموعه داده های ToD انگلیسی برای سه پرونده\u200cهای استفاده از سیستم\u200cهای ToD multilingual. روش ما بر اساس ترجمه کردن قالب\u200cهای گفتگو و پر کردن آن\u200cها با واحدهای محلی در کشورهای زبان هدف است. علاوه بر این، ما پوشش زبانهای هدف را به ۲۰ زبان گسترش می دهیم. ما مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها و مجموعه\u200cی خط\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای قوی را برای تحقیقات در سیستم\u200cهای ToD multilingual برای پرونده\u200cهای واقعی استفاده می\u200cکنیم.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren hat sich die Datenkuration für mehrsprachige aufgabenorientierte Dialogsysteme (ToD) entwickelt, die Menschen mit unterschiedlichen Sprachen dienen können. Bestehende mehrsprachige ToD-Datensätze haben jedoch aufgrund der hohen Kosten für die Datenkuration entweder eine begrenzte Abdeckung von Sprachen oder ignorieren die Tatsache, dass Dialoge in Ländern, die diese Sprachen sprechen, kaum existieren. Um diesen Einschränkungen entgegenzuwirken, führen wir eine neuartige Datenkuratierungsmethode vor, die GlobalWoZ --- einen großen mehrsprachigen ToD-Datensatz generiert, der aus einem englischen ToD-Datensatz globalisiert wird und für drei unerforschte Anwendungsfälle mehrsprachiger ToD-Systeme verwendet werden kann. Unsere Methode basiert auf der Übersetzung von Dialogvorlagen und deren Befüllung mit lokalen Einheiten in den Zielländern. Außerdem erweitern wir die Abdeckung der Zielsprachen auf 20-Sprachen. Wir werden unseren Datensatz und eine Reihe starker Baselines veröffentlichen, um die Erforschung mehrsprachiger ToD-Systeme für reale Anwendungsfälle zu fördern.', 'sw': 'Katika miaka michache iliyopita, kumekuwa na hatua kuelekea vizuizi vya taarifa kwa ajili ya mazungumzo yanayoelekezwa kwa lugha mbalimbali (ToD) yanayoweza kuwatumia watu kuzungumza lugha tofauti. Hata hivyo, taarifa zinazopo kwa lugha mbalimbali za Kitambua ama zina habari mpya za lugha kwa sababu ya gharama kubwa za kufungiwa kwa taarifa, au kupuuza ukweli kuwa vitu vya mazungumzo vingi vigumu katika nchi zinazozungumza lugha hizi. Ili kukabiliana na vizuizi hivi, tunaonyesha njia ya ufungiaji wa taarifa za riwaya zinazotengeneza GlobalWoZ --- seti kubwa ya data ya ToD ya lugha mbalimbali zinazosambazwa kutoka kwenye takwimu za Kiingereza za za ToD kwa matumizi matatu yasiyotarajiwa ya mfumo wa lugha za Kiingereza. Utawala wetu umejikita na kutafsiri misitu ya mazungumzo na kuwajaza vifaa vya ndani katika nchi zenye lugha. Zaidi yake, tunaongeza habari za lugha zinazolenga hadi lugha 20. Tutakitoa taarifa zetu na seti kubwa za misingi ili kuhamasisha tafiti kuhusu mfumo wa lugha mbalimbali wa mfumo wa ToD kwa matumizi halisi.', 'af': "In die laaste paar jaar is daar 'n beweging na data kurasie vir veelvuldige taak-orienteerde dialoog (ToD) stelsels wat mense kan dien wat verskillende tale praat. Maar bestaande multitaalske ToD-datastelle het of 'n beperkte aandekking van tale vanweë die hoë koste van data kurasie, of ignoreer die feit dat dialoog-entiteite skaars bestaan in lande wat hierdie taal praat. Om hierdie beperking te probeer, introduseer ons 'n nuwe data kurasie metode wat globaliseer GlobalWoZ --- ' n groot- skaal multitaalske ToD datastel globaliseer van 'n Engelske ToD datastel vir drie ongeverklare gebruik gevalle van “ multitaalske ToD stelsels. Ons metode is gebaseer op die vertaling van dialoog sjabloane en die vulling van hulle met plaaslike entiteite in die doel- taal lande. Ons verleng die dekking van die doel tale na 20 taal. Ons sal ons datastel en 'n stel sterke basisline verlos om ondersoek op multilinguele ToD stelsels te bevestig vir regte gebruik gevalle.", 'id': 'Selama beberapa tahun terakhir, ada langkah menuju kurasi data untuk sistem dialog berbagai bahasa yang mengarientasi tugas (ToD) yang dapat melayani orang berbicara bahasa yang berbeda. Namun, dataset ToD berbagai bahasa yang ada sama ada memiliki perlindungan terbatas bahasa karena biaya tinggi penyerahan data, atau mengabaikan fakta bahwa entitas dialog hampir tidak ada di negara yang berbicara bahasa-bahasa ini. Untuk mengatasi batasan-batasan ini, kami memperkenalkan metode curasi data yang baru yang menghasilkan GlobalWoZ -- sebuah set data ToD berbagai bahasa besar yang globalisasi dari set data ToD Inggris untuk tiga kasus penggunaan tidak dikenalpasti dari sistem ToD berbagai bahasa. Metode kami berdasarkan menerjemahkan templat dialog dan mengisi mereka dengan entitas lokal di negara-negara bahasa sasaran. Selain itu, kita memperluas penutupan bahasa sasaran ke 20 bahasa. Kami akan melepaskan dataset kami dan set garis dasar yang kuat untuk mendorong penelitian tentang sistem ToD berbagai bahasa untuk kasus penggunaan nyata.', 'tr': 'Soňky bir näçe ýyldan soňra, birnäçe dil dilinde gürleşip biljek adamlary üçin maglumatlar merkezine bir göçdi bar. Ýöne bolan köp dilli ToD datumlary ýagdaýynda munyň üst bahalarynyň sebäbi ýa-da döwletlerde bu diller gepleýän döwletlerde diýen ýagdaýlar bardygyny bilmeýär. Bu çözgütleri çözmek üçin GlobalWoZ --- uluslary bir çoxly dilli ToD veri setinden globalizéieren iňlisçe ToD veri setinden üçin sözümlenmedik üçin täze bir maglumat merkezini tapdyryp tanyşdyrýarys. Biziň yöntemimiz dialogyň çäplerini terjime edip, olaryň ýerli bir zatlary hedef dillerinde doldurmak üçin dayanýar. Munuň ýagdaýda, maksadyň dillerini 20 dile uzatdyrýarys. Berüvlerimizi ve güçlü bir topar çizgileri gerçek işlemler için çoklu dilli ToD sistemlerini incelemek için yayınlayacağız.', 'sq': 'Gjatë viteve të fundit, ka patur një masë drejt kurimit të të dhënave për sistemet e dialogut shumëgjuhës të orientuar në detyra (ToD) që mund të shërbejnë njerëzit që flasin gjuhë të ndryshme. Megjithatë, të dhënat ekzistuese shumëgjuhëse ToD ose kanë një mbulim të kufizuar gjuhësh për shkak të kostos së lartë të kurimit të të dhënave, ose injorojnë faktin se njësitë e dialogut mezi ekzistojnë në vendet që flasin këto gjuhë. Për të trajtuar këto kufizime, ne futim një metodë të re të kurimit të të dhënave që gjeneron GlobalWoZ -- një set të dhënash të shumëgjuhëshme ToD në skalë të madhe të globalizuar nga një set të dhënash të ToD angleze për tre raste përdorimi të papërshqyrtuar të sistemeve ToD shumëgjuhëse. Metoda jonë është bazuar në përkthimin e modeleve të dialogut dhe mbushjen e tyre me njësi lokale në vendet e gjuhës-objektiv. Përveç kësaj, ne zgjerojmë mbulimin e gjuhëve objektive në 20 gjuhë. Ne do të lëshojmë grupin tonë të dhënash dhe një grup bazash të forta për të inkurajuar kërkimin mbi sistemet shumëgjuhëse ToD për raste të përdorimit të vërtetë.', 'am': 'ባለፉት ጥቂት ዓመታት፣ ለቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የሚናገሩትን ሰዎች ለማገልገል የሚችሉትን የዳታ መክፈቻ (ToD) ስርዓቶች ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ However, existing multilingual ToD datasets either have a limited coverage of languages due to the high cost of data curation, or ignore the fact that dialogue entities barely exist in countries speaking these languages.  እነዚህን ግንኙነት ለመቀናቀል፣ የጎልቦልWoZ - በንግግሊዝኛ ToD ዳታተሮች ላይ ለሦስት ያልታወቀ በብልልልቋዊ የጦድ ስርዓት የተለየውን የዳታ ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን አካባቢ ቋንቋ ሀገሮች በማፍለጋት ማህበረሰብ መክፈቻ ላይ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም የደረጃ ቋንቋዎችን ወደ 20 ቋንቋ እናስፋታለን፡፡ የዳታ ሳጥን እና የብርቱ መቀመጫዎችን እናሳድጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին մի քանի տարիների ընթացքում տեղի է ունեցել մի քայլ դեպի տվյալների կառուցվածք բազմալեզու խնդիրների վրա ուղղությամբ խոսակցած համակարգերի համար, որոնք կարող են ծառայել մարդկանց, ովքեր տարբեր լեզուներ են խոսու Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող բազմալեզու ToD տվյալների համակարգերը կամ ունեն լեզուների սահմանափակ ծախսեր տվյալների վերականգնման բարձր արժեքի պատճառով, կամ անտեսեք այն փաստը, որ երկրներում, որոնք այս լեզուներն են խոսում, հազիվ Այս սահմանափակումները լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր տվյալների կարգավորման մեթոդ, որը ստեղծում է Գլոբալ Վոզ, մի մեծ բազլեզու ToD տվյալների համակարգ, որը գլոբալիզացված է անգլերեն ToD տվյալների համակարգից երեք անուսումնասիրելի օգտագործման դեպքերի համար: Our method is based on translating dialogue templates and filling them with local entities in the target-language countries.  Ավելին, մենք ընդլայնում ենք նպատակային լեզուների ծավալը մինչև 20 լեզու: Մենք կհրապարակենք մեր տվյալների համակարգը և ուժեղ հիմքերի համակարգը, որպեսզի խրախուսենք բազմալեզու ToD համակարգերի ուսումնասիրությունը իրական օգտագործման դեպքերում:', 'bn': 'গত কয়েক বছর ধরে অনেক ভাষায় ভাষায় মানুষকে ভিন্ন ভাষাভাষায় কথোপকথন করতে পারে তথ্য কারাগারের দিকে নিয়ে যাওয়ার জন্য একটি পদক্ষেপ ঘট তবে বিদ্যমান বহুভাষায় টোডি ডাটাসেটের বিভিন্ন ভাষার সীমাবদ্ধ কাভারেজ রয়েছে ডাটা কুরেশনের বেশী খরচের কারণে, অথবা এই বাস্তবতাকে উপেক্ষা করা  এই সীমাবদ্ধতার মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা একটি নভেল ডাটা কুরেশন পদ্ধতি চিহ্নিত করি যা গ্লোবালউজ - একটি বিশাল মাল্টাল ভাষায় বহুভাষী টোডি ডাটাসেট বিশ্ববিদ্যালয় করে একটি ইংর আমাদের পদ্ধতি টার্গেট ভাষার দেশে ডায়ালগের মন্দির অনুবাদ করার উপর ভিত্তিতে এবং তাদের স্থানীয় বস্তুর সাথে পূরণ কর এছাড়াও, আমরা টার্গেট ভাষার কাভারেজ ২০ ভাষায় বাড়িয়ে দেই। আমরা আমাদের ডাটাসেট এবং বেশ কিছু শক্তিশালী বেসেইন মুক্তি দেব যাতে বাস্তবতা ব্যবহারের ক্ষেত্রে বহুভাষায় টোডি স', 'az': 'Son bir neçə il içində, çoxlu dil tərəfindən danışan danışma sistemlərinə verilən məlumatların məlumatlarına tərəf gəldi. Halbuki, çox dilli ToD verilən qurbanları məlumatların yüksək qiymətlərinin ucbatından müəyyən edilmiş dillərin örtüsü var, ya da məlumatların bu dillərin danışdığı məlumatların çox az olmadığını unutmayın. Bu limitlərə çəkilmək üçün, GlobalWoZ-dən oluşan yeni məlumat qırma metodlarını təşkil edirik --- çox dilli ToD veri qurğuları İngilizci ToD veri qurğuundan globalizləşdirilmiş üç müfəssəl istifadə edilməmiş və çox dilli ToD sistemlərinin istifadə edilməsi üçün böyük bir çox dilli ToD veri qurğu Bizim metodumuz dini şablonları tercümə etmək və onları məqsəd dil ülkelərində yerli məlumatlarla doldurmaq üçün dayanılır. Əksinə, məqsəd dillərin əhvalatını 20 dilə uzatdıq. Biz verilənlərimizi və çoxlu dilli ToD sistemlərini gerçek istifadə məqsədilə təşkil etmək üçün qüvvətli sətirlərimizi yayınlayacağıq.', 'bs': 'Tokom poslednjih nekoliko godina, postoji potez prema kuraciji podataka za sisteme dijaloga orijentiranog na multijezičkim zadatkama (ToD) koji mogu služiti ljudima koji govore različite jezike. Međutim, postojeći multijezički podaci o ToD-u ili imaju ograničeni pokrivač jezika zbog visoke troškove kuracije podataka, ili ignoriraju činjenicu da dijalogske entitate jedva postoje u zemljama koje govore ovim jezicima. Za rješavanje tih ograničenja, predstavljamo novu metodu kuracije podataka koji stvara GlobalWoZ -- veliku multijezičku kompletu podataka za ToD globaliziranu iz kompleta podataka engleskog ToD-a za tri neočekivane slučajeve korištenja multijezičkih ToD-a. Naša metoda je bazirana na prevodu šablona dijaloga i ispunjavanju ih lokalnim entitetima u zemljama ciljanog jezika. Osim toga, proširimo pokrivanje ciljnih jezika na 20 jezika. Oslobodit ćemo naš set podataka i skup jakih osnovnih linija za poticanje istraživanja o multijezičkim sistemima ToD-a za stvarne slučajeve upotrebe.', 'cs': 'V posledních několika letech došlo k posunu směrem ke správě dat pro systémy vícejazyčného dialogu orientovaného na úkoly (ToD), které mohou sloužit lidem mluvícím různými jazyky. Stávající vícejazyčné datové sady ToD však buď mají omezené pokrytí jazyků kvůli vysokým nákladům na kuraci dat, nebo ignorují skutečnost, že dialogové subjekty v zemích hovořících těmito jazyky sotva existují. Pro řešení těchto omezení představujeme novou metodu kurace dat, která generuje GlobalWoZ --- rozsáhlý vícejazyčný datový soubor ToD globalizovaný z anglického ToD datového souboru pro tři neprozkoumané případy použití vícejazyčných ToD systémů. Naše metoda je založena na překladu šablon dialogu a jejich vyplnění lokálními subjekty v cílových jazykových zemích. Kromě toho rozšiřujeme pokrytí cílových jazyků na dvacet jazyků. Zveřejníme náš datový soubor a sadu silných základních linií, abychom podpořili výzkum vícejazyčných ToD systémů pro reálné případy použití.', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on liikutud andmete kureerimise suunas mitmekeelsete ülesannetele orienteeritud dialoogi süsteemide jaoks, mis võivad teenindada erinevaid keeli rääkivaid inimesi. Siiski on olemasolevatel mitmekeelsetel tööalase dokumendi andmekogumitel andmete kureerimise kõrge maksumuse tõttu piiratud keelte katvus või ignoreeritakse asjaolu, et neid keeli rääkivates riikides on dialoogiüksused vaevalt olemas. Nende piirangute kõrvaldamiseks tutvustame uudset andmete kureerimise meetodit, mis genereerib GlobalWoZ -- suure mitmekeelse ToD andmekogumi, mis on globaliseeritud inglise ToD andmekogumist kolme uurimata kasutusjuhtumi mitmekeelsete ToD süsteemide jaoks. Meie meetod põhineb dialoogimallide tõlkimisel ja nende täitmisel sihtkeele riikide kohalike üksustega. Lisaks laiendame sihtkeelte katvust 20 keelele. Avaldame oma andmekogumi ja tugevad lähtejooned, et julgustada teadusuuringuid mitmekeelsete ToD süsteemide kohta reaalsete kasutusjuhtumite puhul.', 'ca': "Durant els darrers anys, ha estat un pas cap a la curació de dades per a sistemes multilingües de diàleg orientat a les tasques (ToD) que poden servir a la gent que parla llengües diferents. Tot i així, els conjunts de dades multilingües existents de ToD tenen una cobertura limitada de llengües a causa del cost elevat de la curació de dades, o ignoren el fet que les entitats de diàleg gairebé existen en països que parlen aquestes llengües. Per enfrontar aquestes limitacions, introduim un nou mètode de curació de dades que genera GlobalWoZ -- un conjunt de dades multilingües ToD a gran escala globalitzat d'un conjunt de dades ToD anglès per tres casos d'ús no explorats de sistemes ToD multilingües. El nostre mètode es basa en traduir models de diàleg i omplir-los amb entitats locals dels països de llenguatge alvo. A més, estendem la cobertura de les llengües alvo a 20 llengües. Vam publicar el nostre conjunt de dades i un conjunt de línies de base fortes per incentivar la recerca sobre sistemes multilingües de ToD per casos d'ús real.", 'fi': 'Viime vuosina on siirrytty kohti datan kuratointia monikielisille tehtävälähtöisille dialogijärjestelmille, jotka voivat palvella eri kieliä puhuvia ihmisiä. Nykyisissä monikielisissä ToD-tietoaineistoissa on kuitenkin joko rajoitettu kielikattavuus tietojen keruun korkeiden kustannusten vuoksi, tai sivuutetaan se, että näitä kieliä puhuvissa maissa on tuskin olemassa vuoropuheluyksiköitä. Näiden rajoitusten poistamiseksi esittelemme uuden datan kuratointimenetelmän, joka luo GlobalWoZ: n – suuren mittakaavan monikielisen ToD-aineiston, joka on globalisoitu englanninkielisestä ToD-aineistosta kolmeen tutkimattomaan monikielisten ToD-järjestelmien käyttötapaukseen. Menetelmämme perustuu vuoropuhelumallien kääntämiseen ja niiden täyttämiseen kohdemaiden paikallisyhteisöillä. Lisäksi laajennamme kohdekielten kattavuutta 20 kieleen. Julkaisemme aineistomme ja vahvat lähtökohdat kannustaaksemme monikielisten ToD-järjestelmien tutkimusta todellisissa käyttötapauksissa.', 'ha': "Daga ƙidãyar shẽkar da suka shige, an sami wata motsi zuwa tsarin data wa zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayani na mulki-aiki (ToD) wanda ke iya amfani da mutane da ke faɗi lugha daban-daban. A lokacin da, tsarin mutane na mulki-lingui na ToD ko sun ƙunsa da tsarin harshen, ko kuma don ka ƙyale da gaskiyar zauren akwatin bayani na nan da ake faɗa lugha nan. Ko haɗi da waɗannan tsararin, za mu introduce wata hanyor tsarin data na nowaya wanda ke ƙara ga GobalWoZ--- tsarin data mai girma da mulki-lingui'in ToD wanda aka yi globalisa daga data na Ingiriya ToD na daidaita wa 'yan'uwan na'ura da ba'a yi buƙata ba. Tsarin mu na ɗauki a kan fassarar misãlai na zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayani da kuma yana cika su da abubuwa masu lokaci cikin ƙasan-harshe na ƙayyade. Ina faɗa, za'a shimfiɗa kalmõmin da aka yi amfani da shi zuwa harshen 20. Za mu sakar da tsarin danganmu da wasu misãlai mai ƙarfi dõmin mu yi ƙaramako ga fitina na'ura na'ura-wasu na'ura wa masu amfani da masu gaskiya.", 'he': 'במהלך השנים האחרונות, היתה התקדמות לכיוון טיפול נתונים למערכות דיאלוג מורכבות לשפות רבות (ToD) שיכולות לשרת אנשים מדברים שפות שונות. בכל אופן, קבוצות נתונים ToD רבות שפות קיימות או יש כיסוי מוגבל של שפות בגלל העלות הגבוהה של טיפול נתונים, או להתעלם מהעובדה שליחידות דיאלוג בקושי קיימות במדינות מדברות שפות אלה. כדי להתמודד עם המגבלות האלה, אנחנו מכירים שיטת טיפול נתונים חדשה שמוצרת גלובלוווז -- קבוצת נתונים ToD רבות-שפותית גדולה השיטה שלנו מבוססת על תרגום דוגמני דיאלוג וממלא אותם עם יחידות מקומיות במדינות שפת המטרה. חוץ מזה, אנחנו ממשיכים את הכיסוי של שפות המטרה ל-20 שפות. אנחנו נפרסם את קבוצת המידע שלנו וערכת קווי בסיס חזקים כדי לעודד מחקר על מערכות ToD רבות שפות למקרים שימוש אמיתי.', 'sk': 'V zadnjih nekaj letih je prišlo do priprave podatkov za večjezične sisteme dialoga, usmerjene v naloge, ki lahko služijo ljudem, ki govorijo različne jezike. Vendar pa imajo obstoječi večjezični nabori podatkov o dokumentih bodisi omejeno pokritost jezikov zaradi visokih stroškov zbiranja podatkov bodisi ignorirajo dejstvo, da dialogni subjekti komaj obstajajo v državah, ki govorijo te jezike. Za odpravo teh omejitev predstavljamo novo metodo kuracije podatkov, ki ustvarja GlobalWoZ -- obsežen večjezični nabor podatkov ToD globaliziran iz angleškega nabora podatkov ToD za tri neraziskane primere uporabe večjezičnih sistemov ToD. Naša metoda temelji na prevajanju predlog dialoga in njihovem polnjenju z lokalnimi subjekti v državah ciljnega jezika. Poleg tega razširimo pokritost ciljnih jezikov na 20 jezikov. Objavili bomo naš nabor podatkov in nabor močnih osnovnih linij za spodbujanje raziskav večjezičnih sistemov ToD za resnične primere uporabe.', 'jv': 'Eror kanggo tekan anyar sampeyan, durung nggawe data curation kanggo sistem sing dadi nggawe langkung task-Oriented (ToD) sistem sing bisa dianggo populer sampeyan uga. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness kanggo nambah perusahaan iki, kita mulai nggawe sistem dadi nggawe dolanan ingkang dolanan dadi sing bisa nggawe Global alWoZ --- un akeh-scale multilanguage ToD dataset global method Inga mbengok, kéné iso nglanggar aturan kanggo kalaman luwih dumadhi kanggo awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé bakal ngembukaké dataset nganggo sistem sing paling nggawe gerakan kanggo nguasai pergambar barang kanggo sistem ToD sing paling dhéwé.', 'bo': 'འདས་བའི་ལོ་ངོ་ཤས་ཀྱི་རིང་ལ། སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱས། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་ཡིག ཚད་འདི་དག་གི་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དོན་ལས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱས་ན། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བརྒྱུད་ལམ་ཞིག་introduce a new data curation method that generates GlobalWoZ --- a large-scale multilingual ToD dataset globalized from an English ToD dataset for three unexplored use cases of  multilingual ToD systems. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཚུལ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་སྐད་རིགས་༢༠་བར་གཏོང་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མཛུབ་གླིང་སྒྲིག་གཙོ་རིམ་ཅིག་བཏོན་གཏོང་། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ToD་ལག་སྟར་བད'}
{'en': 'Prototypical Verbalizer for Prompt-based Few-shot Tuning', 'ar': 'نقل معرفة المجال لنموذج اللغة المدرب مسبقًا عبر التقطير المعاير لحدود التنشيط', 'fr': "Transfert de connaissances de domaine pour un modèle de langage pré-entraîné via la distillation de limite d'activation étalonnée", 'pt': 'Transferência de conhecimento de domínio para modelo de idioma pré-treinado por meio de destilação de limite de ativação calibrada', 'es': 'Transferencia de conocimientos de dominio para un modelo de lenguaje preentrenado mediante destilación de límites de activación calibrada', 'ja': '較正された活性化境界蒸留を介した事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルのためのドメインナレッジ転送', 'hi': 'डोमेन ज्ञान कैलिब्रेटेड सक्रियण सीमा आसवन के माध्यम से पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के लिए स्थानांतरण', 'ru': 'Передача знаний по предметной области для предварительно обученной языковой модели с помощью откалиброванной граничной дистилляции активации', 'zh': '因校准激活界提炼预练言语模样的领地', 'ga': 'Aistriú Eolais Fearainn don tSamhail Teanga Réamhoilte trí Dhriogadh Teorann Gníomhachtaithe Calabraithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Tartományi ismeretek átvitele előre képzett nyelvi modellekhez kalibrált aktiválási határdesztillációval', 'el': 'Μεταφορά γνώσεων τομέα για προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο μέσω βαθμονομημένης απόσταξης οριακών ορίων ενεργοποίησης', 'it': 'Trasferimento delle conoscenze del dominio per un modello linguistico pre-addestrato tramite distillazione calibrata del limite di attivazione', 'mk': 'Пренесување на знаење за домен за предобучен јазички модел преку калибрирана дистилација на границите на активација', 'kk': 'Домен білім беру үшін алдын- оқылған тіл үлгісін калибрлеген белсендіру шегін шектеу арқылы', 'lt': 'Domain Knowledge Transferring for Pre-trained Language Model via Calibrated Activation Boundary Distillation', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварын Домен мэдлэг Трансферинг Калибритерийн Activation Boundary Distillation', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലിനുള്ള ഡോമെന്\u200d അറിവ് മാറ്റുന്നു', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Pengetahuan Domain untuk Model Bahasa Terlatih Melalui Distillasi Sempadan Aktifasi Berkalibrasi', 'mt': 'Trasferiment ta’ Għarfien Domeniku għal Mudell tal-Lingwa mħarreġ minn qabel permezz ta’ Distillazzjoni tal-Limitu tal-Attivazzjoni Kalibrata', 'no': 'Domenekunnskap overføring for før- trengte språk- modell via kalibrert aktiveringsgrenseavdeling', 'pl': 'Transfer wiedzy domeny dla wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego poprzez kalibrowaną destylację graniczną aktywacji', 'ro': 'Transferul cunoștințelor de domeniu pentru modelul lingvistic pre-instruit prin distilarea calibrată a limitei de activare', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje znanja domena za predobučeni jezički model putem kalibracije granice aktivnosti', 'so': 'Ku wareejinta aqoonta Domain Model of Pre-trained Language via Calibrated Activation Boundary Distillation', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Överföring av domänkunskaper för färdigutbildad språkmodell via kalibrerad aktiveringsgräns destillation', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி மாற்றத்திற்கான டொமைன் அறிவு மாற்றம்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền trình nền Kiến thức miền cho mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo thông qua hiệu chỉnh giới động', 'da': 'Overførsel af domæne viden til forududdannet sprogmodel via kalibreret aktiveringsgrænsedestillation', 'de': 'Transfer von Domänenwissen für vortrainiertes Sprachmodell mittels kalibrierter Aktivierungsgrenzdestillation', 'bg': 'Прехвърляне на знания за домейн за предварително обучен езиков модел чрез калибрирана дестилация на границата за активиране', 'nl': 'Domeinnichtoverdracht voor voorgetraind taalmodel via gekalibreerde activatiegrensdestillatie', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje znanja domena za predobučeni jezički model putem kalibracije granice aktivnosti', 'fa': 'انتقال علم دامنی برای مدل زبان پیش آموزش با طریق حفاظت مرز فعالیت کالیبرد', 'ko': '표정 활성화 경계 추출에 기반한 예비 훈련 언어 모델 영역 지식 이동', 'id': 'Pemindahan Pengetahuan Domain untuk Model Bahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya melalui Distillasi Batas Aktivasi Kalibrirasi', 'sw': 'Kuhamasisha maarifa ya Domen kwa ajili ya Modeli ya Lugha zilizo na mafunzo kwa kupitia Uchaguzi wa Mipaka', 'tr': 'Öňki bilim Namaýyşçysy Çaltylyk Adynyň modi', 'af': 'Domein kennis oordraging vir vooraf- opgelei taal Model deur Kalibreerde Aktiveeringsgrens Verskiling', 'sq': 'Transferimi i njohurive të dominit për modelin e gjuhës së stërvitur paraprakisht nëpërmjet distilimit të kufirit të aktivizimit të kalibruar', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'bn': 'Domain Knowledge Transferring for Pre-trained Language Model via Calibrated Activation Boundary Distillation', 'hy': 'Դոմենի գիտելիքների փոխանցումը նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի միջոցով կալիբրացված ակտիվացման սահմանափակում', 'az': 'Ön təhsil edilmiş Dil Modeli üçün Domain Bilim Transfering Calibrated Activation Border Distillation vasitəsilə', 'cs': 'Přenos znalostí domény pro předškolený jazykový model prostřednictvím kalibrované aktivační hranice destilace', 'ca': 'Domain Knowledge Transferring for Pre-trained Language Model via Calibrated Activation Boundary Distillation', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje znanja domena za predobučeni jezički model putem kalibracije granice aktivnosti', 'et': 'Domeeniteadmiste edastamine eelõpetatud keelemudeli jaoks kalibreeritud aktiveerimispiiri destilleerimise kaudu', 'fi': 'Domain Knowledge Transfering for Pre-trained Language Model via kalibroitu aktivointiraja tislaus', 'sk': 'Prenos domenskega znanja za vnaprej usposobljen jezikovni model prek kalibrirane destilacije meje aktivacije', 'jv': 'domain knowness transfer for Preview-Trigged Language model by Calibrate Activation Bunday Distillition', 'he': 'העברת מידע של דוגמן שפה מאומן מראש באמצעות דיסטילציה גבוהה פעילות קליבורת', 'ha': 'Motsari ga Cilmi na Domen wa Motel na Akwai Tayyar da aka Faso', 'bo': 'Domain Knowledge Transferring for Pre-trained Language Model via Calibrated Activation Boundary Distillation'}
{'en': 'Prompt-based tuning for pre-trained language models (PLMs) has shown its effectiveness in few-shot learning. Typically, prompt-based tuning wraps the input text into a cloze question. To make predictions, the model maps the output words to labels via a verbalizer, which is either manually designed or automatically built. However, manual verbalizers heavily depend on domain-specific prior knowledge and human efforts, while finding appropriate label words automatically still remains challenging.In this work, we propose the prototypical verbalizer (ProtoVerb) which is built directly from training data. Specifically, ProtoVerb learns prototype vectors as verbalizers by contrastive learning. In this way, the prototypes summarize training instances and are able to enclose rich class-level semantics. We conduct experiments on both topic classification and entity typing tasks, and the results demonstrate that ProtoVerb significantly outperforms current automatic verbalizers, especially when training data is extremely scarce. More surprisingly, ProtoVerb consistently boosts prompt-based tuning even on untuned PLMs, indicating an elegant non-tuning way to utilize PLMs. Our codes are avaliable at https://github.com/thunlp/OpenPrompt.', 'ar': 'منذ تطوير نماذج اللغة المدربة (PLMs) واستخدامها على نطاق واسع ، تم تطبيق العديد من الأساليب لتعزيز أدائها في المهام النهائية في مجالات محددة ، مثل المجالات الطبية الحيوية أو المجالات العلمية. التدريب المسبق الإضافي مع النصوص في المجال هو النهج الأكثر شيوعًا لتوفير المعرفة الخاصة بالمجال لـ PLMs. ومع ذلك ، تتطلب أساليب ما قبل التدريب هذه قدرًا كبيرًا من البيانات في المجال وموارد التدريب ووقت تدريب أطول. علاوة على ذلك ، يجب إعادة التدريب كلما ظهرت PLM جديدة. في هذه الدراسة ، نقترح إطار عمل نقل معرفة المجال (DoKTra) لـ PLMs دون تدريب إضافي في المجال. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم باستخراج معرفة المجال من نموذج لغة سابق التدريب موجود في المجال ونقله إلى PLMs أخرى من خلال تطبيق تقطير المعرفة. على وجه الخصوص ، نستخدم تقطير حدود التنشيط ، والذي يركز على تنشيط الخلايا العصبية المخفية. نطبق أيضًا مصطلح تنظيم الانتروبيا في كل من تدريب المعلمين والتقطير لتشجيع النموذج على توليد احتمالات إخراج موثوقة ، وبالتالي المساعدة في التقطير. من خلال تطبيق إطار عمل DoKTra المقترح على المهام النهائية في المجالات الطبية الحيوية والسريرية والمالية ، يمكن لنماذج الطلاب لدينا الاحتفاظ بنسبة عالية من أداء المعلم وحتى التفوق على المعلمين في مهام معينة. الكود الخاص بنا متاح على https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'fr': "Depuis le développement et l'utilisation généralisée de modèles de langage préformés (PLM), plusieurs approches ont été appliquées pour améliorer leurs performances sur des tâches en aval dans des domaines spécifiques, tels que les domaines biomédicaux ou scientifiques. Une pré-formation supplémentaire avec des textes dans le domaine est l'approche la plus courante pour fournir des connaissances spécifiques à un domaine aux PLM. Cependant, ces méthodes de pré-formation nécessitent des données et des ressources de formation considérables dans le domaine, ainsi qu'une durée de formation plus longue. De plus, la formation doit être réexécutée chaque fois qu'un nouveau PLM apparaît. Dans cette étude, nous proposons un cadre de transfert de connaissances de domaine (DokTra) pour les PLM sans pré-formation supplémentaire dans le domaine. Plus précisément, nous extrayons les connaissances du domaine à partir d'un modèle de langage préformé existant dans le domaine et les transférons à d'autres PLM en appliquant la distillation des connaissances. En particulier, nous utilisons la distillation limite d'activation, qui se concentre sur l'activation des neurones cachés. Nous appliquons également un terme de régularisation de l'entropie à la fois dans la formation des enseignants et dans la distillation pour encourager le modèle à générer des probabilités de sortie fiables et ainsi faciliter la distillation. En appliquant le cadre DokTra proposé à des tâches en aval dans les domaines biomédical, clinique et financier, nos modèles étudiants peuvent conserver un pourcentage élevé de performance des enseignants et même surpasser les enseignants dans certaines tâches. Notre code est disponible sur https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'pt': 'Desde o desenvolvimento e amplo uso de modelos de linguagem pré-treinados (PLMs), várias abordagens foram aplicadas para aumentar seu desempenho em tarefas downstream em domínios específicos, como domínios biomédicos ou científicos. Pré-treinamento adicional com textos no domínio é a abordagem mais comum para fornecer conhecimento específico do domínio aos PLMs. No entanto, esses métodos de pré-treinamento exigem dados e recursos de treinamento consideráveis no domínio e um tempo de treinamento mais longo. Além disso, o treinamento deve ser refeito sempre que um novo PLM surgir. Neste estudo, propomos uma estrutura de transferência de conhecimento de domínio (DoKTra) para PLMs sem pré-treinamento adicional no domínio. Especificamente, extraímos o conhecimento do domínio de um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado no domínio existente e o transferimos para outros PLMs aplicando a destilação do conhecimento. Em particular, empregamos a destilação do limite de ativação, que se concentra na ativação de neurônios ocultos. Também aplicamos um termo de regularização de entropia tanto na formação de professores quanto na destilação para incentivar o modelo a gerar probabilidades de saída confiáveis e, assim, auxiliar a destilação. Ao aplicar a estrutura DoKTra proposta a tarefas posteriores nos domínios biomédico, clínico e financeiro, nossos modelos de alunos podem reter uma alta porcentagem de desempenho do professor e até superá-los em determinadas tarefas. Nosso código está disponível em https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'es': 'Desde el desarrollo y el amplio uso de modelos lingüísticos preentrenados (PLM), se han aplicado varios enfoques para mejorar su rendimiento en tareas posteriores en dominios específicos, como los dominios biomédicos o científicos. La formación previa adicional con textos en el dominio es el enfoque más común para proporcionar conocimientos específicos del dominio a los PLM. Sin embargo, estos métodos de preentrenamiento requieren datos y recursos de capacitación considerables en el dominio y un tiempo de capacitación más prolongado. Además, la formación debe volver a realizarse cada vez que surja un nuevo PLM. En este estudio, proponemos un marco de transferencia de conocimiento de dominio (DoKtra) para PLM sin formación previa adicional en el dominio. Específicamente, extraemos el conocimiento del dominio de un modelo de lenguaje preentrenado en el dominio existente y lo transferimos a otros PLM mediante la aplicación de la destilación de conocimientos. En particular, empleamos la destilación de límites de activación, que se centra en la activación de neuronas ocultas. También aplicamos un término de regularización de entropía tanto en la formación de maestros como en la destilación para fomentar que el modelo genere probabilidades de producción confiables y, por lo tanto, ayudar a la destilación. Al aplicar el marco DoKtra propuesto a las tareas posteriores en los dominios biomédico, clínico y financiero, nuestros modelos de estudiantes pueden retener un alto porcentaje del rendimiento de los maestros e incluso superar a los maestros en ciertas tareas. Nuestro código está disponible en https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ja': '事前に訓練された言語モデル（ ＰＬＭ ）の開発と広範な使用以来、いくつかのアプローチが、生物医学または科学領域などの特定の領域の下流タスクにおけるパフォーマンスを向上させるために適用されてきた。 ドメイン内テキストによる追加の事前トレーニングは、ドメイン固有の知識をPLMに提供するための最も一般的なアプローチです。 しかしながら、これらの事前トレーニング方法には、かなりのドメイン内データとトレーニングリソース、およびより長いトレーニング時間が必要です。 さらに、新しいPLMが出現するたびにトレーニングを再実行する必要があります。 この研究では、ドメイン内事前トレーニングを追加することなく、PLMのためのドメイン知識転送（ DoKTra ）フレームワークを提案します。 具体的には、既存のドメイン内事前訓練言語モデルからドメイン知識を抽出し、知識蒸留を適用することによって他のPLMに転送します。 特に、隠れたニューロンの活性化に焦点を当てた活性化境界蒸留を採用しています。 また、教師訓練と蒸留の両方にエントロピー正規化項を適用して、モデルが信頼できる出力確率を生成することを奨励し、蒸留を支援します。 提案されたDoKTraフレームワークを生物医学、臨床、および財務領域の下流タスクに適用することで、私たちの学習者モデルは教師のパフォーマンスの高いパーセンテージを維持し、特定のタスクで教師を上回ることさえできます。 コードはhttps://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTraから入手できます。', 'hi': 'प्रीट्रेन्ड लैंग्वेज मॉडल (पीएलएम) के विकास और व्यापक उपयोग के बाद से, विशिष्ट डोमेन में डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों पर उनके प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए कई दृष्टिकोण लागू किए गए हैं, जैसे कि बायोमेडिकल या वैज्ञानिक डोमेन। इन-डोमेन ग्रंथों के साथ अतिरिक्त पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण पीएलएम को डोमेन-विशिष्ट ज्ञान प्रदान करने के लिए सबसे आम दृष्टिकोण है। हालांकि, इन पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण विधियों को काफी इन-डोमेन डेटा और प्रशिक्षण संसाधनों और लंबे समय तक प्रशिक्षण समय की आवश्यकता होती है। इसके अलावा, जब भी कोई नया पीएलएम उभरता है तो प्रशिक्षण को फिर से किया जाना चाहिए। इस अध्ययन में, हम अतिरिक्त इन-डोमेन प्रीट्रेनिंग के बिना पीएलएम के लिए एक डोमेन ज्ञान हस्तांतरण (DoKTra) ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एक मौजूदा इन-डोमेन प्रीट्रेन्ड भाषा मॉडल से डोमेन ज्ञान निकालते हैं और ज्ञान आसवन लागू करके इसे अन्य पीएलएम में स्थानांतरित करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम सक्रियण सीमा आसवन को नियोजित करते हैं, जो छिपे हुए न्यूरॉन्स के सक्रियण पर केंद्रित है। हम मॉडल को विश्वसनीय आउटपुट संभावनाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करने के लिए शिक्षक प्रशिक्षण और आसवन दोनों में एक एन्ट्रॉपी नियमितीकरण शब्द भी लागू करते हैं, और इस प्रकार आसवन की सहायता करते हैं। बायोमेडिकल, नैदानिक और वित्तीय डोमेन में डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए प्रस्तावित DoKTra ढांचे को लागू करके, हमारे छात्र मॉडल शिक्षक के प्रदर्शन का एक उच्च प्रतिशत बनाए रख सकते हैं और यहां तक कि कुछ कार्यों में शिक्षकों को भी पछाड़ सकते हैं। हमारा कोड https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra पर उपलब्ध है।', 'zh': '自开博用预训(PLM)以来,已用数法,以崇特定域(如生物医学科学)之下流也。 用域内文本额外预培训供 PLM 特定域之常法也。 然此预训练方法须大率土数及训练资源及更长日月。 每有新 PLM ,必复行培训。 于本研中,发无须额外域内预训练PLM领地移(DoKTra)框架。 具体来说以见域内预训言提领,移之他PLM。 特用激活界蒸馏,其重隐神经元之激活。 又于师培训蒸馏中用熵正则化项,以劝模形之可恃者输概率,以助蒸馏。 拟议之DoKTra框架用于生物医学,临床、金融之下流,吾徒模形可以保比例之师绩效,至于优于师。 吾代码可 https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra。', 'ru': 'После разработки и широкого использования предварительно подготовленных языковых моделей (PLMS) было применено несколько подходов для повышения их эффективности при выполнении задач в конкретных областях, таких как биомедицинские или научные области. Дополнительная предварительная подготовка с использованием внутридоменных текстов является наиболее распространенным подходом к предоставлению PLM знаний по конкретным областям. Однако эти методы предварительной подготовки требуют наличия значительных данных и учебных ресурсов в различных областях, а также более продолжительного времени обучения. Кроме того, обучение должно проводиться повторно всякий раз, когда возникает новая PLM. В этом исследовании мы предлагаем структуру передачи знаний домена (DoKTra) для PLM без дополнительного предварительного обучения в домене. В частности, мы извлекаем знания домена из существующей внутридоменной предварительно обученной языковой модели и переносим их в другие PLM, применяя дистилляцию знаний. В частности, мы используем граничную дистилляцию активации, которая фокусируется на активации скрытых нейронов. Мы также применяем термин регуляризации энтропии как в подготовке учителей, так и в дистилляции, чтобы побудить модель генерировать надежные выходные вероятности, и, таким образом, помочь дистилляции. Применяя предлагаемую структуру DoKTra к последующим задачам в биомедицинской, клинической и финансовой областях, наши студенческие модели могут сохранять высокий процент производительности учителя и даже превосходить учителей в определенных задачах. Наш код доступен по адресу https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ga': 'Ó forbraíodh agus ó úsáideadh go forleathan samhlacha teanga réamhoilte (PLManna), cuireadh roinnt cineálacha cur chuige i bhfeidhm chun a bhfeidhmíocht ar thascanna iartheachtacha i réimsí sonracha a threisiú, amhail fearainn bhithleighis nó eolaíochta. Is é réamhoiliúint bhreise le téacsanna in-fhearainn an cur chuige is coitianta chun eolas a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann a sholáthar do PLManna. Mar sin féin, éilíonn na modhanna réamhoiliúna seo go leor sonraí in-fearainn agus acmhainní oiliúna agus am oiliúna níos faide. Ina theannta sin, ní mór an oiliúint a dhéanamh arís nuair a thagann PLM nua chun cinn. Sa staidéar seo, molaimid creat aistrithe eolais fearainn (DoKTra) le haghaidh PLManna gan réamhoiliúint bhreise san fhearann. Go sonrach, bainimid an t-eolas fearainn ó mhúnla teanga réamhoilte in-fearainn atá ann cheana féin agus aistrímid go PLManna eile é trí dhriogadh eolais a chur i bhfeidhm. Go háirithe, bainimid úsáid as driogadh teorann gníomhachtaithe, a dhíríonn ar ghníomhachtú néaróin i bhfolach. Cuirimid téarma rialtaithe eantrópachta i bhfeidhm freisin in oiliúint mhúinteoirí agus i ndriogadh araon chun an tsamhail a spreagadh chun dóchúlachtaí iontaofa aschuir a ghiniúint, agus mar sin cabhrú leis an driogadh. Trí chreat molta DoKTra a chur i bhfeidhm ar thascanna iartheachtacha sna réimsí bithleighis, cliniciúla agus airgeadais, is féidir lenár samhlacha mac léinn céatadán ard d’fheidhmíocht na múinteoirí a choinneáil agus fiú níos fearr a bhaint as na múinteoirí i dtascanna áirithe. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ka': 'განვითარება და უფრო გამოყენება საუკეთესო ენის მოდელების (PLMs) განვითარებადან, რამდენიმე მიზეზები გამოყენებულია, რომლებიც ბიომედიციო ან მეცნიერო დიომენეების განმავლობაში, რომლებ დამატებული პროცემენტის ტექსტის პროცემენტი არის ყველაზე საერთო პროცემენტი პროცემენტის პროცემის კონფიგურაცია პროცემენზე. მაგრამ, ეს წინ განაცემის მეტი უნდა იჭირდება დიდი მონაცემები და განაცემის რესურსები და უფრო მეტი განაცემის დროს. დამატებით, როდესაც ახალი PLM იქნება, სწავლება უნდა გავაკეთება. ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ მინდომენტის კონფიგურაციას (DoKTra) პროგრამის კონფიგურაციას პროგრამის დამატებით პროგრამის კონფიგურაციას. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ დიომინის ცნობილების ექსტრუქტრებით დომინის მოდელიდან, რომელიც არსებობს წინასწორებული ენის მოდელიდან და გადატვირდებით სხვა PLMs-ში, რომე განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ აკეთებულება საზოგადოებოდ განსხვავება, რომელიც კონუქტურებული ნეირონების აკეთებულებაზე დავყენებთ. ჩვენ ასევე ვყენებთ ენტროპია რეგილარიზაციის ტერმინი მასწავლებელი განსწავლებაში და დისტლილაციაში, რომ მოდელის მოძრაობას წარმოიდგინოთ დარწმუნებელი გამოყენების შესაძლებლობა ჩვენი სტუდენტის მოდელები შეუძლიათ სტუდენტის მუშაობის უფრო დიდი პროცენტის გამოყენება და სტუდენტის მუშაობისთვის უფრო მეტი გამოყენება. ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'el': 'Από την ανάπτυξη και ευρεία χρήση των προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων (PLM), έχουν εφαρμοστεί διάφορες προσεγγίσεις για την ενίσχυση της απόδοσής τους σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες σε συγκεκριμένους τομείς, όπως οι βιοϊατρικοί ή επιστημονικοί τομείς. Η πρόσθετη προεκπαίδευση με κείμενα εντός του τομέα είναι η πιο κοινή προσέγγιση για την παροχή γνώσεων ειδικά στον τομέα των ΠΜΣ. Ωστόσο, αυτές οι μέθοδοι προ-κατάρτισης απαιτούν σημαντικά επιτόπια δεδομένα και πόρους κατάρτισης και μεγαλύτερο χρόνο κατάρτισης. Επιπλέον, η εκπαίδευση πρέπει να επαναληφθεί κάθε φορά που εμφανίζεται μια νέα ΠΜΣ. Στην παρούσα μελέτη, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο μεταφοράς γνώσεων στον τομέα (DOKTra) για PLMs χωρίς πρόσθετη προ-εκπαίδευση στον τομέα. Συγκεκριμένα, εξάγουμε τη γνώση του τομέα από ένα υπάρχον μοντέλο προετοιμασίας γλώσσας εντός του τομέα και τη μεταφέρουμε σε άλλα μέσω της απόσταξης γνώσης. Ειδικότερα, χρησιμοποιούμε απόσταξη ορίων ενεργοποίησης, η οποία επικεντρώνεται στην ενεργοποίηση των κρυμμένων νευρώνων. Εφαρμόζουμε επίσης έναν όρο κανονικοποίησης της εντροπίας τόσο στην εκπαίδευση των εκπαιδευτικών όσο και στην απόσταξη για να ενθαρρύνουμε το μοντέλο να παράγει αξιόπιστες πιθανότητες παραγωγής, και έτσι να βοηθήσει την απόσταξη. Εφαρμόζοντας το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες στον βιοϊατρικό, κλινικό και οικονομικό τομέα, τα μοντέλα των μαθητών μας μπορούν να διατηρήσουν υψηλό ποσοστό απόδοσης των εκπαιδευτικών και ακόμη να ξεπεράσουν τους εκπαιδευτικούς σε ορισμένες εργασίες. Ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'hu': 'Az előképzett nyelvi modellek kifejlesztése és széles körű alkalmazása óta számos megközelítést alkalmaztak annak érdekében, hogy növeljék teljesítményüket bizonyos területeken, például az orvosbiológiai vagy tudományos területeken. A domain-specifikus ismeretek biztosításának leggyakoribb megközelítése a domain-specifikus szövegekkel történő további előképzés. Ezek az előképzési módszerek azonban jelentős területi adatokat és képzési forrásokat igényelnek, valamint hosszabb képzési időt igényelnek. Ezenkívül a képzést újra el kell végezni, amikor új PLM jelenik meg. Jelen tanulmányban egy domain knowledge transzfer (DokTRA) keretrendszert javasolunk PLM-ekhez további domain előképzés nélkül. Konkrétan a domain ismereteket egy meglévő domain előképzett nyelvmodellből vonjuk ki, és tudásdesztálás alkalmazásával továbbítjuk más PLM-ekre. Különösen aktivációs határ desztillációt alkalmazunk, amely a rejtett neuronok aktiválására összpontosít. Ezenkívül entrópia regularizációs kifejezést alkalmazunk mind a tanárképzésben, mind a desztillációban, hogy ösztönözzük a modell megbízható kimeneti valószínűségeket generáljon, és így segítsük a desztillációt. A javasolt Doktra keretrendszer alkalmazásával az orvosbiológiai, klinikai és pénzügyi területeken végzett downstream feladatokra, hallgatói modelleink a tanári teljesítmény magas százalékát megtarthatják, sőt bizonyos feladatokban a tanárok felett is teljesíthetik. A kódunk elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'it': "Dopo lo sviluppo e l'ampio utilizzo di modelli linguistici pre-addestrati (PLM), sono stati applicati diversi approcci per migliorare le loro prestazioni in compiti a valle in settori specifici, come quelli biomedici o scientifici. La pre-formazione aggiuntiva con testi in-domain è l'approccio più comune per fornire conoscenze specifiche di dominio ai PLM. Tuttavia, questi metodi di pre-formazione richiedono notevoli dati e risorse formative interne e un tempo di formazione più lungo. Inoltre, l'addestramento deve essere ripetuto ogni volta che emerge un nuovo PLM. In questo studio, proponiamo un framework di trasferimento di conoscenze di dominio (Doktra) per PLM senza ulteriore pretraining in-domain. In particolare, estraiamo la conoscenza del dominio da un modello linguistico pre-addestrato esistente in-domain e la trasferiamo ad altri PLM applicando la distillazione della conoscenza. In particolare, utilizziamo la distillazione al limite di attivazione, che si concentra sull'attivazione di neuroni nascosti. Applichiamo anche un termine di regolarizzazione entropica sia nella formazione degli insegnanti che nella distillazione per incoraggiare il modello a generare probabilità di produzione affidabili e quindi aiutare la distillazione. Applicando il framework DoKTra proposto ai compiti a valle nei settori biomedico, clinico e finanziario, i nostri modelli di studenti possono mantenere un'alta percentuale di prestazioni degli insegnanti e persino superare gli insegnanti in determinati compiti. Il nostro codice è disponibile all'indirizzo https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'lt': 'Nuo to laiko, kai buvo parengti ir plačiai naudojami išankstinio mokymo kalbų modeliai, buvo taikomi keli metodai, kaip gerinti jų veiklos rezultatus tolesnėse užduotyse konkrečiose srityse, pavyzdžiui, biomedicinos ar mokslo srityse. Papildomas išankstinis mokymas su srities tekstais yra labiausiai paplitęs požiūris į konkrečios srities žinių teikimą PLM. Tačiau šiems pasirengimo mokymui metodams reikia daug duomenų ir mokymo išteklių srityse bei ilgesnio mokymo laiko. Be to, mokymas turi būti atnaujintas, kai atsiranda nauja PLM. In this study, we propose a domain knowledge transferring (DoKTra) framework for PLMs without additional in-domain pretraining.  Konkrečiai, mes išgauname žinias apie sritį iš esamo išankstinio mokymo kalbos modelio ir perduodame ją kitoms PLM taikant žinių distiliaciją. Visų pirma naudojame aktyvavimo ribinę distiliaciją, kuri sutelkiama į paslėptų neuronų aktyvavimą. Mes taip pat taikome entropijos reguliavimo term in ą tiek mokytojų mokyme, tiek distiliavime, kad skatintume model į sukurti patikimas gamybos tikimybes ir taip padėti distiliavimui. Taikant siūlomą DoKTra sistemą tolesnėms užduotims biomedicinos, klinikinės ir finansų srityse, mūsų student ų modeliai gali išlaikyti didelę mokytojų veiklos dalį ir net viršyti mokytojų tam tikrose užduotyse. Mūsų kodas pateikiamas https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'kk': 'Тілдер үлгілерін жасау және көпшілікті қолдану үшін бірнеше жағдай қолданылады, мысалы биомедицина не ғылыми домендер секілді, өзінің көпшілікті тапсырмаларын көтеру үшін. Домен мәтіндерінің қосымша алдын- ала оқыту - PLMs- ге домен ерекше білім беру үшін ең жалпы тәсіл. Бірақ бұл алдыңғы оқыту әдістері домендегі деректер мен оқыту ресурстарын және ұзақ оқыту уақытын талап етеді. Қосымша, жаңа PLM шығанда оқыту қайта істеу керек. Бұл зерттеулерде домен білім беру (DoKTra) бағдарламасының қосымша доменге қосымша қосымша қосымша қосымша қосымша қолданылады. Сонымен қатар, доменде болған тіл үлгісінен доменнің білімін тарқатып, білім дистриляциясын қолдану арқылы басқа PLMs ге аударып тастаймыз. Әсіресе, біз белсендіру шектерінің дистилациясын қолданамыз. Бұл жасырылған нейрондардың белсендіруіне назар аударады. Мұғалім оқу және дистилациялау үшін ентропия үлгіліктерін қолдану үшін үлгісін сенімді шығару мүмкіндіктерін құру үшін қолдануға болады. Сонымен қатар, дистилацияны көмект DoKTra бағдарламасының биомедикалық, клиникалық және финансиялық домендерінде тапсырмаларды төмендету үшін қолданып студенттердің үлгілеріміз мұғалімдердің жұмысының пайызын жоғары сақтауға болады және бір тап Біздің кодмыз бар https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'mk': 'Од развојот и широката употреба на предобучените јазички модели (ПЛМ), неколку пристапи се применети за зголемување на нивните резултати во понатамошните задачи во специфични домени, како што се биомедицинските или научните домени. Дополнителна предобука со тексти во домен е најчестото пристап за обезбедување на знаење специфично за домен на PLMs. However, these pre-training methods require considerable in-domain data and training resources and a longer training time.  Покрај тоа, обуката мора да се респроведува секогаш кога ќе се појави нова ПЛМ. Во оваа студија, предложуваме рамка за пренесување на знаење на домен (DoKTra) за PLM без дополнително претренирање во домен. Specifically, we extract the domain knowledge from an existing in-domain pretrained language model and transfer it to other PLMs by applying knowledge distillation.  In particular, we employ activation boundary distillation, which focuses on the activation of hidden neurons.  Ние, исто така, аплицираме термин за регуларизација на ентропијата во обуката на учителите и дистилацијата за да го охрабриме моделот да генерира доверливи веројатности на излез, и така да помогне во дистилацијата. Со примената на предложената рамка на Доктра на понатамошните задачи во биомедицинските, клиничките и финансиските области, нашите студентски модели можат да задржат висок процент на наставничките изведувања и дури и да ги надминат наставниците во одредени задачи. Нашиот код е достапен на https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'mt': 'Mill-iżvilupp u l-użu wiesa’ ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel (PLMs), ġew applikati diversi approċċi biex isaħħu l-prestazzjoni tagħhom fuq kompiti downstream f’oqsma speċifiċi, bħal oqsma bijomediċi jew xjentifiċi. It-taħriġ minn qabel addizzjonali b’testi f’dominju huwa l-approċċ l-aktar komuni għall-għoti ta’ għarfien speċifiku għal dominju lill-PLMs. Madankollu, dawn il-metodi ta’ qabel it-taħriġ jeħtieġu dejta konsiderevoli fil-qasam u riżorsi ta’ taħriġ u żmien itwal ta’ taħriġ. Barra minn hekk, it-taħriġ għandu jerġa’ jitwettaq kull meta jitfaċċa PLM ġdid. In this study, we propose a domain knowledge transferring (DoKTra) framework for PLMs without additional in-domain pretraining.  B’mod speċifiku, aħna nieħdu l-għarfien tad-dominju minn mudell eżistenti ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel fid-dominju u nittrasferiwh lil PLMs oħra billi napplikaw distillazzjoni tal-għarfien. In particular, we employ activation boundary distillation, which focuses on the activation of hidden neurons.  Applikaw ukoll terminu ta’ regolarizzazzjoni tal-entropija kemm fit-taħriġ tal-għalliema kif ukoll fid-distillazzjoni biex in ħeġġu l-mudell biex jiġġenera probabbiltajiet affidabbli tal-produzzjoni, u b’hekk jgħinu d-distillazzjoni. Permezz tal-applikazzjoni tal-qafas DoKTra propost għal kompiti downstream fl-oqsma bijomediċi, kliniċi u finanzjarji, il-mudelli tal-istudenti tagħna jistgħu jżommu perċentwal għoli tal-prestazzjoni tal-għalliema u saħansitra jaqbżu l-għalliema f’ċerti kompiti. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'no': 'Siden utviklinga og breidde bruk av språk-modeller (PLMs) er brukt fleire tilnærmingar for å styrke utviklinga sine på nedstremde oppgåver i spesifikke domene, som biomedisk eller vitenskapelige domene. Ekstra føreøving med tekstar i domenet er den vanlege tilnærming for å gje domenespesifikke kunnskap til PLMs. Desse føreøvingsmetodane krev imidlertid mykje i domenedata og opplæringsressursar og lengre treningstid. I tillegg må opplæringa gjenoppretta når ein ny PLM oppstår. I denne studien foreslår vi eit domenekunnskap som overfører (DoKTra) rammeverk for PLMs utan tilleggsvising i domenet. Dette er spesielt at vi ekstraherer domenekunnskapen frå eit eksisterande språk- modell i domenet og overfører det til andre PLMs ved å bruka kunnskapsdistillasjon. I særskilt bruker vi aktiveringsgrensedestilasjon, som fokuserer på aktivering av skjulte neurone. Vi bruker også ein entropi-reguleringsuttrykk i både lærarar-trening og destilasjon for å oppretta modellen for å laga tilgjengelege utskriftssannsynlighetar, og derfor hjelpa destilasjonen. Ved å bruka den foreslåde DoKTra-rammeverket for å nedtrekke oppgåver i biomedisinske, kliniske og finansielle domene, studentmodellen våre kan beholda ein høg prosent av lærarar og til og med utføre lærarar i visse oppgåver. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ml': 'പ്രത്യേക ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ വികസിപ്പും വിശാലമായ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുശേഷം, പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള ഡോമീനുകളില്\u200d അവരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പല ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളുമായി കൂടുതല്\u200d മുന്നോട്ട് പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് പിഎല്\u200dഎസ്സിന് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d  എന്നാലും ഈ പ്രോഗ്രെയിന്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനിലെ ഡേറ്റാ വിവരങ്ങളും പരിശീലനവിഭവങ്ങളും കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലന സമയവും ആവശ് പുതിയ പിഎല്\u200dഎം പുറത്തുവരുമ്പോള്\u200d പരിശീലനം വീണ്ടും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പിഎഎല്\u200dഎസിന് ഒരു ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അറിവ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d ഡൊമ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നിലവിലുള്ള ഒരു ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d നിന്നും അറിവ് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു. പരിജ്ഞാന വ്യത്യാസവും  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന അതിര്\u200dത്തി വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് രഹസ്യമായ നെബ്രോണുകളുടെ പ്രവ ടീച്ചര്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിലും വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നതിലും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു എന്\u200dട്രോപ്പി നിയന്ത്രണവാക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മോഡലിന് ആശ്വാസപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമ നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡോക്ട്രാവിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ജീവിയ മെഡിക്കല്\u200d, ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d എന്നിവയുടെയും സമ്പത്തിക്കല്\u200d ജോലികളില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'pl': 'Od czasu opracowania i szerokiego stosowania wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych (PLM) zastosowano kilka podejść, aby zwiększyć ich wydajność w dalszych zadaniach w określonych dziedzinach, takich jak dziedziny biomedyczne lub naukowe. Dodatkowe szkolenia wstępne z tekstami wewnątrz domeny to najczęstsze podejście do dostarczania wiedzy specyficznej dla PLM. Jednakże te metody przedszkoleniowe wymagają znacznych danych wewnętrznych i zasobów szkoleniowych oraz dłuższego czasu szkolenia. Ponadto szkolenie musi być ponownie przeprowadzane, gdy pojawi się nowy PLM. W niniejszym opracowaniu proponujemy framework transferu wiedzy domeny (Doktra) dla PLM bez dodatkowego wstępnego treningu wewnątrz domeny. W szczególności wyodrębniamy wiedzę domeny z istniejącego modelu językowego w domenie i przekazujemy ją do innych PLM poprzez stosowanie destylacji wiedzy. W szczególności stosujemy destylację granic aktywacyjnych, która koncentruje się na aktywacji ukrytych neuronów. Stosujemy również termin regulalizacji entropii zarówno w szkoleniu nauczycieli, jak i destylacji, aby zachęcić model do generowania wiarygodnych prawdopodobieństw wydajności, a tym samym wspomagać destylację. Dzięki zastosowaniu proponowanych ram Doktra do dalszych zadań w dziedzinie biomedycznej, klinicznej i finansowej, nasze modele studenckie mogą utrzymać wysoki procent wyników nauczycieli, a nawet przewyższać nauczycieli w niektórych zadaniach. Nasz kod jest dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ro': 'De la dezvoltarea și utilizarea pe scară largă a modelelor lingvistice pre-instruite (PLM), au fost aplicate mai multe abordări pentru a spori performanța acestora în sarcinile din aval în domenii specifice, cum ar fi domeniile biomedicale sau științifice. Formarea prealabilă suplimentară cu texte în domeniu este cea mai comună abordare pentru furnizarea de cunoștințe specifice domeniului către PLM. Cu toate acestea, aceste metode de pre-formare necesită date și resurse de formare în domeniu considerabile și un timp mai lung de formare. Mai mult decât atât, instruirea trebuie reluată ori de câte ori apare un nou PLM. În acest studiu, propunem un cadru de transfer de cunoștințe de domeniu (DokTRA) pentru PLM fără pre-training suplimentar în domeniu. Mai exact, extragem cunoștințele de domeniu dintr-un model lingvistic pre-instruit existent în domeniu și le transferăm la alte PLM prin aplicarea distilării cunoștințelor. În special, utilizăm distilarea limitelor de activare, care se concentrează pe activarea neuronilor ascunsi. De asemenea, aplicăm un termen de regularizare a entropiei atât în formarea profesorilor, cât și în distilarea pentru a încuraja modelul să genereze probabilități fiabile de producție și, astfel, să ajute distilarea. Prin aplicarea cadrului Doktra propus sarcinilor din aval din domeniile biomedical, clinic și financiar, modelele noastre de studenți pot păstra un procent ridicat de performanță a profesorilor și chiar depăși profesorii în anumite sarcini. Codul nostru este disponibil la https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн хэл загварын хөгжлийн болон өргөн хэрэглээнээс хойш, биологийн эмнэлгийн эсвэл шинжлэх ухааны сүлжээнд ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэх олон арга зам ашиглагдсан. Холбооны текстэй нэмэлт өмнө суралцах нь ПЛМ-д тодорхой мэдлэг өгөх хамгийн ихэвчлэн арга зам юм. Гэвч эдгээр өмнөх сургалтын арга нь мэдээллийн, сургалтын болон урт сургалтын цаг хэрэгтэй. Дараа нь, шинэ ПЛМ гарах үед сургалт дахин дахин хийх хэрэгтэй. Энэ судалгаанд бид ПЛМ-ийн дотор нэмэлт хэмжээний мэдлэгийг дамжуулах (DoKTra) системийг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бид холбоотой мэдлэгийг холбоотой хэл загвараас гаргаж, мэдлэг ялгааг ашиглаж бусад ПЛМ руу шилжүүлнэ. Ялангуяа бид нуугдсан мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлт дээр ажилладаг. Бид бас багш нарын суралцах болон сайжруулахын тулд энтропийн шууд байдлын томъёог ашиглаж, загварыг итгэлтэй боломжтой гаргах боломжтой боломжтой боломжтой боломжтой болгох боломжтой болго Биологийн эмнэлгийн, клиник, санхүүгийн газрын ажил бууруулахад бидний оюутнуудын загвар багш нарын үйл ажиллагааны хувьд өндөр хувь нь багш нарын үйл ажиллагааг хадгалах боломжтой болно. Бидний код нь https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ms': 'Sejak pembangunan dan penggunaan luas model bahasa terlatih (PLM), beberapa pendekatan telah dilaksanakan untuk meningkatkan prestasi mereka pada tugas turun dalam domain tertentu, seperti domain biomedis atau saintifik. Pra-latihan tambahan dengan teks dalam domain adalah pendekatan yang paling umum untuk menyediakan pengetahuan spesifik domain kepada PLMs. Namun, kaedah pra-latihan ini memerlukan data dalam domain dan sumber latihan yang besar dan masa latihan yang lebih panjang. Moreover, the training must be re-performed whenever a new PLM emerges.  Dalam kajian ini, kami melamar kerangka pemindahan pengetahuan domain (DoKTra) untuk PLM tanpa latihan tambahan dalam domain. Secara khusus, kita mengekstrak pengetahuan domain dari model bahasa yang ada dalam domain yang telah dilatih dan memindahkannya ke PLM lain dengan melaksanakan penapisan pengetahuan. Secara khususnya, kita menggunakan penapisan sempadan aktivasi, yang fokus pada aktivasi neuron tersembunyi. We also apply an entropy regularization term in both teacher training and distillation to encourage the model to generate reliable output probabilities, and thus aid the distillation.  Dengan melaksanakan kerangka DoKTra yang diusulkan untuk tugas turun dalam bidang biomedis, klinik, dan keuangan, model pelajar kita boleh menyimpan peratus tinggi prestasi guru dan bahkan melebihi guru dalam tugas tertentu. Kod kita tersedia di https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'sv': 'Sedan utvecklingen och den breda användningen av förkränade språkmodeller (PLM) har flera metoder tillämpats för att förbättra deras prestanda i efterföljande aktiviteter inom specifika områden, såsom biomedicinska eller vetenskapliga områden. Ytterligare fortbildning med in-domain texter är det vanligaste sättet att tillhandahålla domänspecifik kunskap till PLM. Dessa fortbildningsmetoder kräver dock betydande data- och utbildningsresurser inom området och längre utbildningstid. Dessutom måste utbildningen genomföras på nytt när en ny PLM uppstår. I denna studie föreslår vi ett ramverk för domänkunskapsöverföring (Doktra) för PLM utan ytterligare in-domain-pre-training. Specifikt extraherar vi domänkunskapen från en befintlig förkränd språkmodell inom domänen och överför den till andra PLM genom att tillämpa kunskapsdestillation. I synnerhet använder vi aktiveringsgränsdestillation, som fokuserar på aktivering av dolda neuroner. Vi tillämpar också en entropi regularisering term i både lärarutbildning och destillation för att uppmuntra modellen att generera tillförlitliga produktionssannolikheter och därmed underlätta destillationen. Genom att tillämpa det föreslagna DoKTra-ramverket på nedströmsuppgifter inom biomedicinska, kliniska och finansiella områden kan våra studentmodeller behålla en hög procentandel av lärarprestationen och till och med överträffa lärarna i vissa uppgifter. Vår kod finns tillgänglig på https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ඩ් භාෂා මොඩේලන්ගේ විශාලනය සහ විශේෂ භාවිතාවක් නිසා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා, විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපනය සහ විද්\u200d තවත් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dර නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ ඩොමේන් දත්ත සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න සාධ ඒවගේම, අලුත් ප්\u200dරධානයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් නැවත පුළුවන් වෙයි. මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි දේමින් දන්නවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය (DoKTra) ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝ විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි දේමින් දන්නවය අරගෙන ඉතිරිය භාෂා මොඩේලයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට අරගෙන ඒක අනිත් ප්\u200dලී විශේෂයෙන්, අපි සක්\u200dරීය සීමාව විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒක හැංගිත න්\u200dයුරෝන්ස් සක්\u200dරීය කරනවා. අපි ඉන්ට්\u200dරෝපිය සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සහ විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා විශ්වාසිත ප්\u200dරයෝජන අපේ විද්\u200dයාපාරිත්තු මොඩේල්ස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාගන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාපාරිත්තා විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපකය, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන් https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'so': 'Tan iyo horumarinta iyo isticmaalka muuqashada afka hore (PLMs), waxaa loo codsaday qaabab badan oo lagu kordhiyo hawlaha hoose-dureerka, tusaale ahaan goobaha caafimaadka ama cilmi-cilmi ah. Additional pre-training with in-domain texts is the most common approach for providing domain-specific knowledge to PLMs.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababkan waxbarasho-horaadka waxaa loo baahan yahay macluumaad aad u adag, waxbarasho iyo waqti dheer waxbarasho. Sidoo kale waa in la sameeyaa waxbarashada marka uu soo baxo PLM cusub. Waxbarashadan waxaynu u soo jeedinnaa qorshaha aqoonta bedelka (DoKTra) ee PLMs, iyadoo aan lagu arag wax dheeraad ah oo ku qoran domain-beddelka. Si gaar ah, aqoonta deegaanka ayaannu ka soo saarnaa noocyada afka ee gudaha ku jira, waxaana ku wareejinaynaa macluumaadka kale ee PLMs. Si gaar ah, waxaan shaqaynaynaa soohdinta waxqabadka, taas oo ku kalsoonaanaya waxqabadka neuroyinka qarsoon. Sidoo kale waxaynu u codsanaynaa waqti la xeerariyo macallimiinta iyo kala duwanaanta, si aan u dhiirrigelino tilmaanka uu u sameyno suurtagalka soo bixinta ee aamin ah, sidaasana u caawinaa furiinka. Sida lagu codsado shuqullada la soo jeeday ee DoKTra in lagu sameeyo hawlaha hoos-dureerka ee dhakhaatiirta, dhakhaatiirta iyo dhaqaalaha, qaabilayaashayada waxbarashadu waxay ku qaadan karaan boqolkiiba waxbarashada iyo xittaa ay macallimiinta ku sameyn karaan shaqooyin qaarkood. Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ur': 'پیٹرین کی زبان مدل (PLMs) کی توسعہ اور وسیع استعمال کی وجہ سے بہت سی طریقے استعمال کیے گئے ہیں کہ ان کے عملہ کو نیچے پاؤنٹریم کے کاموں میں مشخص دامنوں میں زیادہ دکھائے جاتے ہیں، جیسے بیویڈیکسی یا سائنس ڈومین. ڈومین ٹیکسٹ کے ساتھ اضافہ پیش آموزش پیدا کرنا سب سے زیادہ عام طریقہ ہے جسے ڈومین خاص علم پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ However, these pre-training methods require considerable in-domain data and training resources and a longer training time. اور جب کوئی نئی PLM ظاہر ہوتی ہے تو تمرین دوبارہ کرنا چاہیے۔ اس مطالعہ میں، ہم ایک ڈومین علم تغییر دینے (DoKTra) فرمود پیش کریں گے PLMs کے لئے بغیر ڈومین میں اضافہ تغییر دینے کے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم دامنی علم کو ایک دامنی میں موجود زبان کی مدل سے نکالتے ہیں اور اسے دوسرے PLMs کی طرف متفرق کر رہے ہیں، علم اختلاف کے ذریعہ۔ مخصوصا، ہم فعالیت کے مرزہ ڈیسٹلیشن کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، جو چھپائے نیرونوں کے فعالیت پر تمرکز کرتی ہے. ہم نے بھی استاد کی تعلیم اور پھیلانے میں ایک انٹروپی ریاضیل ترمینٹ کی عبارت کے ساتھ استعمال کیا ہے کہ مدل کو یقینی اجلام شانس پیدا کرے اور اسی طرح پھیلانے کی مدد کریں. ڈوک ترا کی پیشنهاد کرنا کے ذریعہ سے بیویڈیکسی، کلینیکی اور مالی ڈومین میں کام نازل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، ہمارے استاد مدلکوں نے استعمال کی بہت بالا فیصد حصہ رکھ سکتے ہیں اور کچھ کاموں میں بھی استعمال کرنے والوں سے زیادہ اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہمارا کوڈ اس میں موجود ہے https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ta': 'முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகளின் உருவாக்கம் மற்றும் அகலமாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது பிஎல்எம்ஸ், குறிப்பிட்ட களங்களில் உள்ள செயல்பாட்டை அதிகரிக டொமைன் உரைகளுடன் கூடுதல் முன் பயிற்சி PLMs க்கு குறிப்பிட்ட அறிவை வழங்குவதற்கான பொதுவான வழியாகும். ஆனால், இந்த முன் பயிற்சி முறைமைகள் உள்ளமையில் தரவுகள் மற்றும் பயிற்சி மூலம் மற்றும் நீண்ட பயிற்சி நேரத்தை  ஒரு புதிய PLM வெளியேறும்போது பயிற்சியை மீண்டும் இயக்க வேண்டும். இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் PLMs க்கான களம் அறிவு மாற்றுதல் (DoKTra) சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். கூடுதலாக உள்ளமைப்பு மாற் குறிப்பிட்டு, குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் செயல்பாட்டின் எல்லை வேறுபாட்டை வேலை செய்கிறோம், அது மறைந்த நரம்புகளின் செயல்பாட்டை கவனம ஆசிரியர் பயிற்சி மற்றும் பிரிப்பு மற்றும் மாதிரியை உறுதிப்படுத்த முடியாத வெளியீடுகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு, அதனால் பிரிப்புகளை உதவுகி திருத்தப்பட்ட ட டாக்ட்ராவின் சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தி உயிரியல் மருத்துவ, மருத்துவ, மற்றும் நிதிய மூலங்களில் கீழே தள்ளும் பணிகளை பயன்படுத்தி, எங்கள் மாணவர்களி எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'sr': 'Od razvoja i široke korištenja pretkivnih jezičkih modela (PLMs), primjenjena je nekoliko pristupa kako bi se povećala njihova učinkovitost na ponašanju zadataka u specifičnim domenama, poput biomedicinskih ili naučnih domena. Dodatna predobuka sa tekstima u domenu je najčešći pristup za pružanje specifičnih znanja domena PLMsima. Međutim, te metode pre obuke zahtevaju značajne podatke i resurse obuke u domenu i duže vreme obuke. Osim toga, trening mora biti ponovno izvršen kad se pojavi novi PLM. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo okvir prijenosa znanja domena (DoKTra) za PLMs bez dodatnih pretresanja u domenu. Posebno, izvlačimo znanje domena iz postojećeg jezičkog modela u domenu i prebacimo ga na druge PLMs primjenom destilacije znanja. Posebno, zapošljavamo destilaciju granice aktivacije, koja se fokusira na aktivaciju skrivenih neurona. Takođe primjenjujemo regularizacijski term in entropije u obuci nastavnika i destilaciji kako bi ohrabrili model da bi stvorili pouzdane verovatnosti proizvoda, i tako pomogli destilaciji. Primjenjujući predloženi okvir DoKTra za smanjenje zadataka u biomedicinskim, kliničkim i finansijskim područjima, naši studentski modeli mogu zadržati visok postotak učitelja i čak i nadmašiti učitelje u određenim zadatacima. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi va tezlik tilning modellari (PLMs) bilan foydalanishdan ko'p usullar qo'llangan. Biotek yoki ilmiy domain kabi foydalanuvchilarning quyidagi vazifalarini bajarish uchun ko'p usullar qo'llangan. Name Lekin, bu taʼminlovchi oldin usullar domen maʼlumot, taʼminlovchi manbalar va uzoq taʼminlovchi vaqt kerak. Ko'rsatilgan, yangi PLM kelganda, ta'limni qaytadan bajarish kerak. Bu taʼminda biz PLMs uchun qoʻshimcha domen taʼrif tarkibini o'zgartirish (DoKTra) freymini davom etishni talab qilamiz. Ko'rsatilgan, biz domen haqida mavjud tillar modelidan foydalanuvchi maʼlumotni olib tashlamiz va uni maʼlumot ajratishni qoʻllash uchun boshqa PLMsga olib tashlamiz. Shunday qilib, biz qarshi neyronlarning aktivlashtirish chegarasini bajaramiz. Biz o'qituvchilar tahrirchi va ajratishni o'ylab turamiz va modelni ishlab chiqarishga ishonch hosil qilamiz va shunday qilib ajratishga yordam beramiz. By applying the proposed DoKTra framework to downstream tasks in the biomedical, clinical, and financial domains, our student models can retain a high percentage of teacher performance and even outperform the teachers in certain tasks.  Kodlash usuli https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'vi': 'Từ khi phát triển và sử dụng rộng rãi các mô hình ngôn ngữ sẵn sàng (PLM) nhiều phương pháp đã được áp dụng để tăng khả năng hoạt động của chúng trong các công việc xuôi dòng trong một lĩnh vực cụ thể, như lĩnh vực sinh học hay khoa học. Việc huấn luyện thêm với các văn bản nội bộ là cách thức phổ biến nhất để cung cấp cho các nạn nhân hiểu biết về miền. Tuy nhiên, những phương pháp trước khi đào tạo này đòi hỏi dữ liệu và nguồn đào tạo khá lớn trong lĩnh vực và một thời gian đào tạo lâu hơn. Hơn nữa, khi một PLM mới xuất hiện, cuộc huấn luyện phải được tái diễn. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống truyền kiến thức miền (DoKTra) cho các máy tính PLM mà không có tính trước miền thêm. Cụ thể, chúng tôi trích xuất kiến thức miền từ một mô hình ngôn ngữ sẵn sàng trước mặt và chuyển nó sang các PLM khác bằng cách áp dụng từ chưng cất kiến thức. Chúng tôi đặc biệt áp dụng việc chưng cất ranh giới kích hoạt tập trung vào kích hoạt các nơ-ron giấu. Chúng tôi cũng áp dụng một thuật ngữ quy tắc ngẫu nhiên trong cả việc huấn luyện giáo viên và chưng cất để khuyến khích mô hình đem lại khả năng sản xuất đáng tin cậy và trợ giúp việc chưng cất. Bằng cách áp dụng hệ thống DoKTra với các công việc phụ thuộc vào lĩnh vực sinh học, lâm sàng và tài chính, các mẫu học sinh của chúng ta có thể giữ lại tỉ lệ cao của giáo viên và thậm chí vượt trội hơn các giáo viên trong các công việc. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'bg': 'След разработването и широкото използване на предварително обучените езикови модели (ПЛМ) бяха приложени няколко подхода за повишаване на изпълнението им по задачите надолу по веригата в специфични области, като биомедицината или научните области. Допълнителното предварително обучение с текстове в домейна е най-често срещаният подход за предоставяне на специфични за домейна знания на ЛПМ. Тези методи за предварителна подготовка обаче изискват значителни данни и ресурси за обучение в областта и по-дълго време за обучение. Освен това обучението трябва да се извършва повторно, когато се появи нов ПЛМ. В настоящото проучване предлагаме рамка за трансфер на домейни знания (Доктра) за ПЛМ без допълнително предварително обучение в домейна. По-конкретно, извличаме познанията на домейна от съществуващ в домейна предварително обучен езиков модел и ги прехвърляме към други модули чрез прилагане на дестилация на знания. По-специално, ние използваме активационна гранична дестилация, която се фокусира върху активирането на скрити неврони. Също така прилагаме термин за регулировка на ентропията както в обучението на учители, така и в дестилацията, за да насърчим модела да генерира надеждни вероятности за изход и по този начин да подпомогне дестилацията. Чрез прилагането на предложената рамка за задачи надолу по веригата в биомедицинската, клиничната и финансовата сфера нашите модели на ученици могат да запазят висок процент от представянето на учителите и дори да надминат учителите в определени задачи. Нашият код е достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'nl': "Sinds de ontwikkeling en het brede gebruik van voorgetrainde taalmodellen (PLM's) zijn verschillende benaderingen toegepast om hun prestaties op downstreamtaken in specifieke domeinen, zoals biomedische of wetenschappelijke domeinen, te verbeteren. Extra pre-training met in-domain teksten is de meest voorkomende aanpak voor het verstrekken van domeinspecifieke kennis aan PLM's. Deze pre-opleidingsmethoden vereisen echter aanzienlijke interne gegevens en opleidingsmiddelen en een langere opleidingstijd. Bovendien moet de training opnieuw worden uitgevoerd wanneer er een nieuwe PLM ontstaat. In deze studie stellen we een domein kennisoverdracht (Doktra) framework voor PLM's voor zonder extra in-domein pretraining. Specifiek extraheren we de domeinkennis uit een bestaand in-domein voorgetraind taalmodel en brengen deze over naar andere PLM's door kennisdestillatie toe te passen. In het bijzonder maken we gebruik van activatiegrensdestillatie, die zich richt op de activering van verborgen neuronen. We passen ook een entropie regularisatieterm toe in zowel lerarenopleiding als destillatie om het model aan te moedigen betrouwbare outputwaarschijnlijkheden te genereren, en zo de distillatie te helpen. Door het voorgestelde Doktra-raamwerk toe te passen op downstreamtaken in de biomedische, klinische en financiële domeinen, kunnen onze studentenmodellen een hoog percentage van de prestaties van docenten behouden en zelfs de docenten overtreffen in bepaalde taken. Onze code is beschikbaar op https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'da': "Siden udviklingen og den brede anvendelse af prætrænede sprogmodeller (PLM'er) er der blevet anvendt flere tilgange til at øge deres ydeevne i forbindelse med downstream-opgaver inden for specifikke områder, såsom biomedicinske eller videnskabelige områder. Yderligere foruddannelse med in-domain tekster er den mest almindelige tilgang til at give domænespecifik viden til PLM'er. Disse forudgående uddannelsesmetoder kræver imidlertid betydelige data- og uddannelsesressourcer inden for området og længere uddannelsestid. Desuden skal træningen gennemføres, når der opstår en ny PLM. I denne undersøgelse foreslår vi en domæne vidensoverførselsramme (Doktra) for PLM uden yderligere in-domæne foruddannelse. Specielt udtrækker vi domænevidensen fra en eksisterende in-domain forudtrænet sprogmodel og overfører den til andre PLM'er ved at anvende videndedestillation. Især anvender vi aktiveringsgrænsedestillation, som fokuserer på aktivering af skjulte neuroner. Vi anvender også en entropi regularisering term i både læreruddannelse og destillation for at tilskynde modellen til at generere pålidelige output sandsynligheder og dermed fremme destillationen. Ved at anvende den foreslåede DOKTra ramme på downstream opgaver inden for biomedicinske, kliniske og finansielle områder, kan vores studerende modeller fastholde en høj procentdel af lærernes præstationer og endda overperforme lærerne i visse opgaver. Vores kode er tilgængelig på https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'hr': 'S obzirom na razvoj i široku korištenje pretkivnih jezičkih modela (PLMs), primjenjivano je nekoliko pristupa kako bi se povećalo njihov učinkovitost na niz zadatak u specifičnim domenama, poput biomedicinskih ili znanstvenih domenata. Dodatna predobuka s tekstima u domenu je najčešći pristup pružanju znanja u domenu za PLMs. Međutim, te metode predobuke zahtijevaju značajne podatke i izvore obuke u domenu i duže vrijeme obuke. Osim toga, obuka mora biti ponovno provedena kad se pojavi novi PLM. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo okvir prebacivanja znanja domena (DoKTra) za PLMs bez dodatnog pretvaranja u domenu. Posebno, izvlačimo znanje domena iz postojećeg jezičkog modela u domenu i prebacimo ga na druge PLMs primjenom destilacije znanja. Posebno, koristimo destilaciju granice aktivacije, koja se fokusira na aktivaciju skrivenih neurona. Također primjenjujemo regularizacijski term in entropije u obuci učitelja i destilaciji kako bi se ohrabrili model za stvaranje pouzdanih vjerojatnosti proizvoda, te tako pomoći destilaciji. Primjenjujući predloženi okvir DoKTra za smanjenje zadataka u biomedicinskoj, kliničkoj i finansijskoj oblasti, naši studentski modeli mogu zadržati visok postotak učitelja i čak nadmašiti učitelje u određenim zadatacima. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'de': 'Seit der Entwicklung und dem breiten Einsatz von vortrainierten Sprachmodellen (PLMs) wurden verschiedene Ansätze angewandt, um deren Leistung bei nachgelagerten Aufgaben in bestimmten Bereichen, wie biomedizinischen oder wissenschaftlichen Bereichen, zu steigern. Zusätzliche Vortrainings mit In-Domain-Texten sind der gängigste Ansatz, um PLMs domänenspezifisches Wissen zu vermitteln. Diese Methoden erfordern jedoch erhebliche interne Daten und Schulungsressourcen sowie eine längere Schulungszeit. Darüber hinaus muss das Training immer dann wiederholt werden, wenn ein neues PLM entsteht. In dieser Studie schlagen wir ein Domain Knowledge Transfer Framework (Doktra) für PLMs ohne zusätzliches In-Domain Pretraining vor. Konkret extrahieren wir das Domänenwissen aus einem bestehenden in-domain vortrainierten Sprachmodell und übertragen es durch Wissensdestillation auf andere PLMs. Insbesondere setzen wir Aktivierungsgrenzdestillation ein, die sich auf die Aktivierung verborgener Neuronen konzentriert. Wir verwenden auch einen Entropie-Regularisierungsbegriff sowohl in der Lehrerausbildung als auch in der Destillation, um das Modell zu ermutigen, zuverlässige Ertragswahrscheinlichkeiten zu generieren und so die Destillation zu unterstützen. Durch die Anwendung des vorgeschlagenen Doktra-Frameworks auf nachgelagerte Aufgaben im biomedizinischen, klinischen und finanziellen Bereich können unsere Schülermodelle einen hohen Prozentsatz der Lehrerleistung beibehalten und sogar die Lehrer in bestimmten Aufgaben übertreffen. Unser Code ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'id': 'Sejak pengembangan dan penggunaan luas dari model bahasa yang dilatih sebelum dilatih (PLM), beberapa pendekatan telah diaplikasikan untuk meningkatkan prestasi mereka pada tugas turun dalam domain spesifik, seperti domain biomedis atau ilmiah. Pra-pelatihan tambahan dengan teks dalam domain adalah pendekatan yang paling umum untuk menyediakan pengetahuan spesifik domain untuk PLMs. Namun, metode pra-pelatihan ini membutuhkan banyak data dalam domain dan sumber daya pelatihan dan waktu pelatihan yang lebih panjang. Moreover, the training must be re-performed whenever a new PLM emerges.  Dalam studi ini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian pemindahan pengetahuan domain (DoKTra) untuk PLM tanpa perkelahian tambahan dalam domain. Secara spesifik, kita mengekstrak pengetahuan domain dari model bahasa yang ada di domain yang dilatih sebelum dilatih dan memindahkannya ke PLM lainnya dengan menerapkan destilasi pengetahuan. Terutama, kita menggunakan distillasi batas aktivasi, yang fokus pada aktivasi neuron tersembunyi. Kami juga menerapkan istilah regularisasi entropi dalam pelatihan guru dan destilasi untuk mendorong model untuk menghasilkan kemungkinan output yang dapat dipercaya, dan demikian membantu destilasi. Dengan melaksanakan cadangan DoKTra yang diusulkan untuk tugas turun dalam bidang biomedis, klinis, dan keuangan, model siswa kita dapat memelihara persentase tinggi dari pertunjukan guru dan bahkan melampaui batas guru dalam tugas tertentu. Kode kita tersedia di https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ko': '예비훈련언어모델(pretrained language models, PLM)의 발전과 광범위한 사용 이후 생물의학이나 과학 분야와 같은 특정 분야의 하위 임무에 몇 가지 방법이 응용되었다.영역 내 텍스트에 대한 추가 사전 교육은 PLM에 영역별 특정 지식을 제공하는 가장 일반적인 방법입니다.그러나 이런 예비 훈련 방법은 대량의 영역 내 데이터와 훈련 자원, 그리고 더 긴 훈련 시간을 필요로 한다.또한 새로운 PLM이 출시될 때마다 교육을 다시 실시해야 합니다.본 연구에서 우리는 PLMs에 적용되는 분야 지식 이전(DoKtra) 구조를 제시했는데 별도의 분야 내 예비 교육이 필요하지 않다.구체적으로 우리는 기존의 영역 내 사전 훈련 언어 모델에서 영역 지식을 추출하고 지식 추출을 통해 다른 PLM으로 옮긴다.특히 국경증류법을 활성화해 숨겨진 신경원의 활성화에 주목했다.우리는 또한 엔트로피 정규화 항목을 교사 교육과 증류에 응용하여 모델이 신뢰할 수 있는 출력 확률을 생성하도록 장려하고 증류를 돕는다.제시된 Doktra 프레임워크를 생물의학, 임상, 금융 분야의 하위 임무에 응용함으로써 우리의 학생 모델은 비교적 높은 비율의 교사 실적을 유지할 수 있고 심지어 일부 임무에서 교사보다 우수할 수 있다.우리 코드는https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'sw': 'Tangu maendeleo na matumizi mengi ya mifano ya lugha ya kizamani (PLMs), mbinu kadhaa zimekuwa zikitumika kuongeza ufanisi wao kwenye kazi za mito ya chini katika maeneo maalum, kama vile huduma za kitabibu au sayansi. Kwa mafunzo ya kabla ya kutumia ujumbe wa ndani ni njia ya kawaida zaidi ya kutoa maarifa maalum ya ndani kwa ajili ya PLMs. Hata hivyo, mbinu hizi za mafunzo zinahitaji takwimu za ndani na rasilimali za mafunzo na muda mrefu wa mafunzo. Zaidi ya hayo, mafunzo yanapaswa kutekelezwa tena pale kipya cha PLM kinapojitokeza. Katika utafiti huu, tunapendekeza mfumo wa usafirishaji wa maarifa ya ndani (DoKTra) wa chama cha PLMs bila kuongeza matumaini ya ndani. Kwa ujumla, tunatoa maarifa ya ndani kutoka kwa mtindo wa lugha ulioendelea na kuibadilisha kwenye simu nyingine za PLMs kwa kutumia utofauti wa maarifa. Kwa hakika, tunatumia unyanyasaji wa mipaka ya shughuli, ambazo linalenga kwenye hatua ya neuron zilizofichikana. Pia tunatumia muhula wa kudhibiti ujasiri katika mafunzo na kutofautisha kwa walimu ili kuhamasisha mtindo wa kutengeneza uwezekano wa matunda yenye kuaminika, na kwa hiyo tunasaidia kutofautisha. By applying the proposed DoKTra framework to downstream tasks in the biomedical, clinical, and financial domains, our student models can retain a high percentage of teacher performance and even outperform the teachers in certain tasks.  Utawala wetu unapatikana katika https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'tr': "Öň ýakynlaşyk dil nusgalarynyň gelişmesi we uly ulanmagyndan bäri, birnäçe ýagdaý çykyş şeklinde birnäçe golaý üýtgetmek üçin edildi. PLMs'e domain-specific bilim vermek üçin aşırı öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden okuwçy Ýöne bu öň-öňünden öňünden eğitim metodlarynyň domeneň maglumatynda, çeşmeleri we golaý eğitim zamany gerek. Ynsada, täze PLM bolanda öwrenme täzeden ýene-de işlenmeli. In this study, we propose a domain knowledge transfer (DoKTra) framework for PLMs without additional in-domain pretraining. Adatça, domençe önlenmiş dil nusgadan domençylyk bilgilerini çykaryp bilim üýtgetmek üçin başga PLM'lara geçirip götürdük. Aýratyn bolsa, biz janlaşdyrma sahypalaryny ulanýarys, hem gizlenen näронlaryň janlaşdyrmagyny üns berýäris. Biz hem mugallymlaryň eğitimi we taýýarlanmasynda entropiýa düzenlemeli termyny hem nusgasyny güýçli çykyş mümkinçiliklerini döretmek üçin ýöredip, şonuň üçin taýýarlanmasyna kömek edýäris. DoKTra nusgalaryny biomedical, klinikiýa we maliýe sahypalarda täzelikleri indirmek üçin gurnalan çykyş sistemasyna uygulap, okuwçylarymyzyň nusgalarymyz mugallymlaryň etkinlikleriniň ýokary ýokary ýokary bolup biler we hatda mugallymlaryň beýleki zadynda etkinleýär Biziň kodymyz bar https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'fa': 'از زمانی که توسعه و استفاده عمومی از مدل های زبانی پیش ریخته شده (PLMs) چندین دسترسی برای افزایش عملکرد آنها در کارهای پایین پایین در دامنهای مخصوص مانند دامنهای بیولوپزشکی یا علمی استفاده شده\u200cاند. پیش آموزش اضافه با متن\u200cهای دامنه\u200cای بهترین روش برای دادن دانش\u200cهای مخصوص دامنه\u200cای برای PLMs است. ولی این روش پیش آموزش ها نیاز به اطلاعات و منابع آموزش و زمان آموزش بیشتری دارند. علاوه بر این، آموزش باید هر زمانی که یک PLM جدید پیدا شود دوباره انجام شود. در این مطالعه، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار به طور خاصی، ما دانش دامنی را از یک مدل زبانی که در دامنی وجود دارد خارج می کنیم و آن را به دیگر PLMs انتقال می کنیم با تفاوت دانش. مخصوصا، ما از تفریح مرز فعالیت استفاده می کنیم که روی فعالیت نورون مخفی تمرکز می کند. ما همچنین یک کلمه تنظیم انتروپی را در آموزش معلم و تفاوت برای تشویق مدل برای تولید احتمالات نتیجه قابل اعتماد و بدین\u200cسان به تفاوت کمک می\u200cکنیم. با استفاده از چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارپایین، کلینیک و مالی، مدلهای دانشجویان ما می توانند درصد بالا از عملکرد معلم را نگه دارند و حتی معلم ها را در کار خا کد ما در دسترس است https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'af': "Omdat die ontwikkeling en wyde gebruik van voorreine taal modele (PLMs) is, is verskeie toegange aangewend om hul prestasie op onderstreem opdragte in spesifieke domeine, soos biomediese of wetenskaplike domeine te versterk. Addisionele voorvoerring met in-domein-teks is die mees gemeenskaplike toegang vir die verskaffing van domein-spesifieke kennis aan PLMs. Hierdie vooraf-onderwerking metodes verwag tog betekeurige in-domein data en onderwerp hulpbronne en 'n langer onderwerp tyd. Ook moet die oefening heruitgevoer word wanneer 'n nuwe PLM uitkom. In hierdie studie, voorstel ons 'n domein kennis oordrag (DoKTra) raamwerk vir PLMs sonder addisionele in- domein voortreking. Spesifieke, ons uitpak die domein kennis van 'n bestaande in-domein voorrein taal model en oordra dit na ander PLMs deur kennis verskilting te aanwend. In besonderhede, gebruik ons aktivasie grense destilasie, wat fokus op die aktivasie van verborge neurone. Ons het ook 'n entropie regularisasie terme aangepas in onderwysers onderwerp en destilasie om die model te bevestig om betroubare uitvoer waarskynlikheite te genereer, en dus die destilasie te help. Deur die voorgestelde DoKTra raamwerk te toewend na onderstreep opdragte in die biomediese, kliniese en finansiële domene, kan ons studentmodele 'n hoë persentasie van onderwysers uitvoer en selfs die onderwysers in sekere opdragte uitvoer. Ons kode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'sq': 'Që nga zhvillimi dhe përdorimi i gjerë i modeleve të gjuhës së parastërvitur (PLM), janë aplikuar disa qasje për të rritur performancën e tyre në detyrat më poshtë në fusha të caktuara, të tilla si fusha biomedike apo shkencore. Përpara-trainimit shtesë me tekstet në domeni është metoda më e zakonshme për dhënien e njohurive specifike në domeni për PLMs. Megjithatë, këto metoda paratrainimi kërkojnë të dhëna të konsiderueshme në fushë dhe burime trainimi dhe një kohë më të gjatë trainimi. Përveç kësaj, trainimi duhet të ripërkryehet kur të dalë një PLM i ri. Në këtë studim, ne propozojmë një kuadër transferimi të njohurive në domeni (DoKTra) për PLM pa mësim shtesë në domeni. Veçan ërisht, ne nxjerrim njohurinë e domenit nga një model gjuhësh ekzistues në domeni të trajnuar para dhe e transferojmë në PLM të tjerë duke aplikuar distillacionin e njohurisë. Në veçanti, ne përdorim distillacionin kufitar aktivizimi, i cili përqëndrohet në aktivizimin e neuroneve të fshehura. Ne gjithashtu aplikojmë një term ë rregullimi të entropisë si në trajnimin e mësuesve ashtu edhe në distillacionin për të inkurajuar model in për të gjeneruar probabilitete të besueshme të prodhimit dhe kështu të ndihmojmë distillacionin. Duke zbatuar kuadrin e propozuar të DoKTra në detyrat më poshtë në fushat biomedikale, klinike dhe financiare, modelet tanë student ë mund të mbajnë një përqindje të lartë të paraqitjes së mësuesve dhe madje edhe të kryejnë mësuesit në disa detyra. Kodi ynë është në dispozicion në https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'am': 'ከግንኙነት እና በተለየ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች (PLMs) በተዘጋጀ ጀምሮ፣ የውኃ አካባቢ ወይም የሳይንቀሳዊ ድረ ገጾች ላይ የራሳቸውን ስርዓት ለማድረግ በብዙ ደረጃዎች ተግባርተዋል፡፡ የዶሜን ጽሑፎች ለመጠቀም የሚጨምረው የፊደል ትምህርት የዶሜን-specific እውቀትን ለPLMs ለመጠቀም በጣም ትልቅ ነው። ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ የፊተኛ ትምህርት ዘዴዎች የድረ ገጽ ዳታዎችን እና አስተማሪ ሀብትን እና ረጅም ተማሪ ዘመን ያስፈልጋሉ፡፡ ደግሞም አዲስ PLM ሲወጣ ትምህርት ማድረግ እንደገና ይደረጋል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የዶሜን እውቀት መዘዋወር (ዶKTra) የPLMs ፍሬማርቶችን በጨማሪ ውይይት ሳይዘረጋ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ የዶሜን እውቀት ከኖማዊ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ እናወጣዋለን እና እውቀትን ልዩነት በመጠቀም እናስቀዳዋለን፡፡ In particular, we employ activation boundary distillation, which focuses on the activation of hidden neurons.  እና የኢንተሮፕ የሥርዓት ቁጥር በመስተማሪ ማስተማርና ለመለየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴላውን የሚታመነውን ውጤት እንዲያረጋግጥ እና ስለዚህም መለየትን እናበረታለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ዶKTra ፍሬማር ወደ ውኃው ውኃ ማድረግ፣ ባለሞክራዊ እና የሀብት ዳርቻዎች በመጠቀም፣ ተማሪዎቻችን ሞዴሌዎች የአስተማሪውን ድምፅ በቁጥር ከፍ የሚል እና አስተማሪዎችን በተለዩት ስራ ላይ እንዲያደርጉ ይችላሉ፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'hy': 'Since the development and wide use of pretrained language models (PLMs), several approaches have been applied to boost their performance on downstream tasks in specific domains, such as biomedical or scientific domains.  Ավելի նախապատրաստ ուսումնասիրությունը տիեզերական տեքստների հետ ամենատարածված մոտեցումն է տիեզերական գիտելիքների տրամադրման PLM-ներին: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս նախապատրաստման մեթոդները պահանջում են նշանակալի տվյալներ, ուսուցման ռեսուրսներ և երկար ուսուցման ժամանակ: Ավելին, ուսումնասիրությունը պետք է վերարտադրվի, երբ նոր PLM-ը հայտնվում է: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք բնագավառի գիտելիքների փոխանցման (DoKda) շրջանակ PLM-ների համար առանց ավելին բնագավառի նախադասության: Հատկապես, մենք վերցնում ենք տիեզերքի գիտելիքները տիեզերքում գոյություն ունեցող նախադասավորված լեզվի մոդելի միջոցով և փոխանցում ենք այն այլ PLM-ների միջոցով, կիրառելով գիտելիքի դիսլիլացիա: Մենք հատկապես օգտագործում ենք ակտիվացման սահմանային դիսլիլացիա, որը կենտրոնանում է թաքնված նեյրոնների ակտիվացման վրա: Մենք նաև օգտագործում ենք էնտրոպիայի վերահսկողական տերմին ուսուցիչների ուսուցման և դիսլիլացիայի ժամանակ, որպեսզի խրախուսենք մոդելը ստեղծելու վստահելի արտադրման հավանականություններ, և այսպես օգնենք դիսլիլացիան: Օգտագործելով նախագծված Դոկտրա կառուցվածքը կենսաբժշկական, կլինիկական և ֆինանսական ոլորտներում հետագա խնդիրների համար, մեր ուսանողների մոդելները կարող են պահպանել ուսուցիչների արտադրողականության բարձր տոկոսը և նույնիսկ գերազան Մեր կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'az': 'Önüllü dil modellərinin təhsil edilməsindən və geniş istifadə etməsindən sonra, biomedical və elmi sahələrində bənzər təhsil işlərini artırmaq üçün bir çox yol uygulandı. Dömrənin məktumları ilə əlavə təhsil etmək PLMs üçün domain-specific bilgi vermək üçün ən yaygın təhsil idi. Ancaq bu öyrənmək metodları domeinin məlumatları, təhsil resursları və daha uzun təhsil vaxtı lazımdır. Bu təhsil yeni PLM ortaya çıxdığında yenidən təhsil edilməlidir. Bu təcrübə içində, PLMs üçün bir domena bilgi daşıma (DoKTra) framework ü təklif edirik. Özellikle, domenin elmi sahibi olan dil modelindən çıxardıq və elm destilyasını uygulayaraq başqa PLMslərə göndərdik. Özellikle, biz fəaliyyət sınır destilyasını istifadə edirik ki, gizli nöronların fəaliyyətinə odaqlanır. Biz həmçin in müəllimlərə təhsil etmək və destilmək üçün modeli güvenilir çıxış mümkünlükləri yaratmaq üçün entropiya düzgün təhsil edilməsi üçün və bu səbəbdən destilməyə kömək edirik. Bizim öyrəndiyimiz modellərimiz müəllimlərin performansının yüksək procentlərini saxlaya bilər və bəzi işlərdə müəllimlərdən daha üstün olar. Bizim kodumuz https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'bn': 'যেহেতু উন্নয়ন এবং ব্যাপক ভাষার মডেল (পিএলএমএস) ব্যবহার করার পর থেকে বেশ কিছু উপায় প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে বিশেষ ডোমেনের মধ্যে তাদের প্রভাব বিস্তারিত ডোমেন ডোমেইন টেক্সটের সাথে আরো প্রশিক্ষণ হচ্ছে পিএলএমএস-এর জন্য ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট জ্ঞান প্রদানের জন্য সবচেয়ে সাধারণ উপায়। তবে এই পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের পদ্ধতি ডোমেইনের তথ্য এবং প্রশিক্ষণের সম্পদ এবং অনেক দীর্ঘ প্রশিক্ষণের সময়ের প্রয়োজন। এছাড়াও, নতুন পিএলএম যখন প্রশিক্ষণ পুনরায় প্রদর্শন করা আবশ্যক। এই গবেষণায় আমরা পিএলএমএসের জন্য ডোমেইনের জ্ঞান পরিবর্তনের (ডকেট্রা) ফ্রেম প্রস্তাব করছি যেখানে ডোমেইনের অনুভূতি ছাড়া। বিশেষ করে, আমরা ডোমেইনের বিদ্যমান একটি ভাষার মডেল থেকে জ্ঞান বের করে এটি অন্যান্য পিএলএমএসের কাছে পরিণত করি জ্ঞান বৈচিত্র্যের প্রয়োগ বিশেষ করে, আমরা কার্যক্রমের সীমানা বিচ্ছিন্ন করি, যা লুকিয়ে রাখা নিউরনের কার্যক্রমের দিকে মনোযোগ দেয়। এছাড়াও আমরা শিক্ষক প্রশিক্ষণ এবং বিচ্ছেদের মধ্যে একটি এন্ট্রোপি নিয়ন্ত্রণের মেয়াদ প্রয়োগ করি মডেল উৎসাহিত করার জন্য, যাতে তারা বিশ্বস্ত By applying the proposed DoKTra framework to downstream tasks in the biomedical, clinical, and financial domains, our student models can retain a high percentage of teacher performance and even outperform the teachers in certain tasks.  আমাদের কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ca': "Des del desenvolupament i l'ample utilització de models de llenguatge pré-instruits (PLM), s'han aplicat diversos enfocaments per reforçar el seu rendiment en tasques avall en dominis específics, com ara biomèdics o científics. L'entrenament adicional amb textos en domini és l'enfocament més comú per proporcionar coneixements específics en domini a les MPL. No obstant això, aquests mètodes de pré-capacitació requereixen moltes dades en domini i recursos de capacitació i més temps d'entrenament. Moreover, the training must be re-performed whenever a new PLM emerges.  En aquest estudi, proposem un marc de transferència del coneixement de domini (DoKTra) per a MPL sense formació adicional en domini. Concretament, extreuem el coneixement de domini d'un model de llenguatge que existeix en domini i el transfirim a altres PLM aplicant la distillació del coneixement. En particular, fem servir la distillació de fronteres d'activació, que es centra en l'activació de neurones ocultes. També aplicam un terme de regularització de l'entropia tant en la formació dels professors com en la destilació per animar el model a generar probabilitats de producció fiables, i així ajudar la destilació. Aplicant el marc proposat de DoKTra a tasques avançades en els domínios biomèdics, clínics i financers, els nostres models d'estudiants poden mantenir un gran percentatge de rendiment dels professors i fins i tot superar els professors en certes tasques. El nostre codi està disponible en https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'bs': 'Od razvoja i široke korištenja pretkivnih jezičkih modela (PLMs), primjenjena je nekoliko pristupa kako bi se povećala njihova učinkovitost na potpunim zadatkima u specifičnim domenama, poput biomedicinskih ili naučnih domena. Dodatna predobuka s tekstima u domenu je najčešći pristup pružanju znanja u domenu za PLMs. Međutim, te metode predobuke zahtijevaju značajne podatke i resurse obuke u domenu i duže vrijeme obuke. Osim toga, obuka mora biti ponovno provedena kad se pojavi novi PLM. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo okvir prebacivanja znanja domena (DoKTra) za PLMs bez dodatnog pretvaranja domena. Posebno, izvlačimo znanje domena iz postojećeg jezičkog modela u domenu i prebacimo ga na druge PLMs primjenom destilacije znanja. Posebno, koristimo destilaciju granice aktivacije, koja se fokusira na aktivaciju skrivenih neurona. Također primjenjujemo regularizacijski term in entropije u obuci učitelja i destilaciji kako bi se ohrabrili model da bi stvorili pouzdane vjerojatnosti proizvoda, i tako pomogli destilaciji. Primjenjujući predloženi okvir DoKTra za smanjenje zadataka u biomedicinskim, kliničkim i finansijskim područjima, naši studentski modeli mogu zadržati visok postotak učitelja i čak i nadmašiti učitelje u određenim zadatacima. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'cs': 'Od vývoje a širokého používání předtrénovaných jazykových modelů (PLM) bylo aplikováno několik přístupů ke zvýšení jejich výkonu při navazujících úkolech v určitých oblastech, jako jsou biomedicínské nebo vědecké oblasti. Další předškolení s texty v doméně je nejčastějším přístupem k poskytování znalostí specifických pro doménu PLM. Tyto metody předškolení však vyžadují značné vnitřní údaje a zdroje školení a delší dobu školení. Výcvik musí být navíc znovu proveden, kdykoli se objeví nový PLM. V této studii navrhujeme rámec pro přenos znalostí domény (Doktra) pro PLM bez dalšího předškolení v doméně. Konkrétně extrahujeme doménové znalosti z existujícího in-doménového předtrénovaného jazykového modelu a přenášíme je na další PLM pomocí destilace znalostí. Konkrétně používáme aktivační hraniční destilaci, která se zaměřuje na aktivaci skrytých neuronů. Používáme rovněž termín regularizace entropie jak ve vzdělávání učitelů, tak v destilaci, aby model vytvářel spolehlivé pravděpodobnosti výstupu, a tím napomáhal destilaci. Aplikací navrženého rámce Doktra na následné úkoly v biomedicínské, klinické a finanční oblasti mohou naše studentské modely udržet vysoké procento výkonnosti učitelů a dokonce překonat učitele v určitých úkolech. Náš kód je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'et': 'Alates väljaõppeeelsete keelemudelite arendamisest ja laialdasest kasutamisest on nende tulemuslikkuse suurendamiseks konkreetsetes valdkondades, näiteks biomeditsiini- või teadusvaldkondades, rakendatud mitmeid lähenemisviise. Täiendav eelkoolitus valdkonnasiseste tekstidega on kõige levinum lähenemisviis valdkonnaspetsiifiliste teadmiste pakkumiseks PLMidele. Need koolituseelsed meetodid nõuavad siiski märkimisväärseid andmeid ja koolitusressursse ning pikemat koolitusaega. Lisaks tuleb koolitus uuesti läbi viia iga kord, kui ilmneb uus PLM. Selles uuringus pakume välja domeeniteadmiste edastamise (DoKTra) raamistiku PLM-idele ilma täiendava domeenisisese eelõppeta. Täpsemalt ekstraheerime domeeni teadmised olemasolevast domeenisisesest eeltreenitud keelemudelist ja edastame need teistele PLMidele, rakendades teadmiste destilleerimist. Eelkõige kasutame aktiveerimispiiri destilleerimist, mis keskendub varjatud neuronide aktiveerimisele. Samuti rakendame entroopia regulatsiooni terminit nii õpetajate koolituses kui destilleerimises, et julgustada mudelit looma usaldusväärseid toodangutõenäosusi ja seega aitama destilleerimist. Rakendades väljapakutud DoKTra raamistikku järgnevatele ülesannetele biomeditsiini, kliinilise ja finantsvaldkonna valdkonnas, võivad meie õpilasmudelid säilitada suure protsendi õpetajate tulemustest ja isegi ületada õpetajaid teatud ülesannetes. Meie kood on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'fi': 'Valmennettujen kielimallien kehittämisen ja laajan käytön jälkeen on sovellettu useita lähestymistapoja, joilla parannetaan niiden suorituskykyä jatkojalostuksen tehtävissä tietyillä aloilla, kuten biolääketieteen tai tieteen aloilla. Yleisin tapa antaa verkkotunnuskohtaista tietoa PLM:ille on antaa verkkotunnuskohtaista tietoa. Nämä esikoulutusmenetelmät edellyttävät kuitenkin huomattavia tietoja ja koulutusresursseja sekä pidempää koulutusaikaa. Lisäksi koulutus on suoritettava uudelleen aina, kun uusi PLM syntyy. Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotamme Domain Knowledge Transfering (DoKTra) -viitekehystä PLM:ille ilman erillistä esikoulutusta. Tarkemmin sanottuna poimimme verkkotunnustiedon olemassa olevasta verkkotunnuksen esikoulutetusta kielimallista ja siirrämme sen muille PLM:ille soveltamalla tietämyksen tislausta. Erityisesti käytämme aktivointirajatislausta, joka keskittyy piilotettujen neuronien aktivointiin. Käytämme myös entropian säännöstelyn termiä sekä opettajankoulutuksessa että tislauksessa kannustaaksemme mallia luomaan luotettavia tuotantotodennäköisyyksiä ja siten auttamaan tislausta. Sovelltamalla ehdotettua DoKTra-kehystä biolääketieteen, kliinisen ja taloudellisen alan loppupään tehtäviin opiskelijamallimme voivat säilyttää suuren prosenttiosuuden opettajien suorituskyvystä ja jopa ylittää opettajat tietyissä tehtävissä. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'he': 'מאז הפיתוח והשימוש הרחב של דוגמני שפת מתאמנים מראש (PLMs), הופעו כמה גישות כדי להעלות את ביצועיהם על משימות מתחתיות בתחומים מסוימים, כמו בתחומים ביולורפואיים או מדעיים. האימונים הקדמיים נוספים עם טקסטים בתחום הוא הגישה המפורסמת ביותר לספק ידע ספציפי לתחום PLMs. However, these pre-training methods require considerable in-domain data and training resources and a longer training time.  חוץ מזה, האימונים חייבים להיבצע מחדש בכל פעם שפותח PLM חדש. במחקר הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת מעברת ידע בתחום (DoKTra) עבור PLMs ללא אימון מחדש בתחום נוסף. במיוחד, אנו מוציאים את הידע של התחום ממודל שפת קיים בתחום שמתאמן לפני שימוש, ומעבירים אותו לאחרים PLMs על-ידי שימוש שטיח ידע. במיוחד, אנו משתמשים בשימוש גבול הפעילה, שמתמקד על הפעילה של נוירונים מוסתרים. אנחנו גם משתמשים במונחים של רפובליזציה באנטרופיה באימונים של המורים וגם בשיטוק כדי לעודד את המודל לייצר סבירות יציאה אמיתיות, ולכן לסייע למשתוק. על ידי שימוש במסגרת DoKTra המוצעת למשימות מתקדמות בתחום הביומדיקאי, קליני והפיננסי, דוגמני הסטודנטים שלנו יכולים לשמור על אחוז גבוה של ביצועי המורה ואפילו להעביר את המורים במשימות מסוימות. הקוד שלנו זמין ב https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'ha': "Tana da za'a buɗe da amfani da misãlai na lugha (PLM), an applied wasu shiryoyin su da wajen ƙãra aikin su a kan taskõkin ruwa masu cikin kewayi masu ƙayyade, kamar misãlin madaidaici ko da masu sakan da aka sani. @ info: whatsthis Haƙĩƙa, waɗannan hanyoyin zaman shawara sun ƙayyade masu girma cikin-Domen data da kuma ma'anar amfani da lokaci tsawo. Da haka, sai a sake tafiyar da shirin wata sabo na PLM. Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã buɗa wani filin da aka motsar da ilmi na Domen (DoKTra) wa PLM bã da wani ƙara cikin-Domen mai nuna. Aka ƙayyade, Munã fiɗe ilmi ɗin Domen daga wani misalin harshen wanda ke cikin-Domen da aka bayyana shi kuma Muke shige shi zuwa wasu PLM da za'a sami da zane-zane. Kayya, za mu yi aiki da rarrabai na ƙayyade akan aiki, wadda ke muhalli a kan aikin neuron da aka ɓõye. Yana amfani da muhallin taƙaitarwa a cikin laban macallin da rarrabẽwa dõmin mu yi wa'amar shirin su sami mutane da za'a iya sami mutane da inganci, kuma don haka yana taimakon rarrabẽwa. Ko da ya tambayi firam na DoKTra da aka buƙata zuwa aikin na ƙarami a cikin mazaɓa, madaidaici da kuma ma'anar, misalinmu na karatun karatunmu yana iya ƙaranci a tsakanin fassarar mafalin mafalin da kuma sai ya cika macallin a cikin aikin fulani. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.", 'sk': 'Od razvoja in široke uporabe predtreniranih jezikovnih modelov (PLM) je bilo uporabljenih več pristopov za povečanje njihove uspešnosti pri nadaljnjih nalogah na določenih področjih, kot so biomedicinska ali znanstvena področja. Dodatno predusposabljanje z domenskimi besedili je najpogostejši pristop za zagotavljanje domenskega znanja za PLM. Vendar pa te metode predusposabljanja zahtevajo precejšnje podatke in vire usposabljanja ter daljši čas usposabljanja. Poleg tega je treba usposabljanje ponovno opraviti, kadar se pojavi nov PLM. V tej študiji predlagamo okvir za prenos domenskega znanja (DoKTra) za PLM brez dodatnega domenskega predusposabljanja. Natančneje, domensko znanje izvlečemo iz obstoječega domenskega predtreniranega jezikovnega modela in ga prenesemo na druge PLM z uporabo destilacije znanja. Predvsem uporabljamo aktivacijsko mejno destilacijo, ki se osredotoča na aktivacijo skritih nevronov. Pri usposabljanju učiteljev in destilaciji uporabljamo tudi termin regulacije entropije, ki spodbuja model k ustvarjanju zanesljivih možnosti proizvodnje in s tem pomaga pri destilaciji. Z uporabo predlaganega okvira DoKTra pri nadaljnjih nalogah na biomedicinskem, kliničnem in finančnem področju lahko naši študentski modeli ohranijo visok odstotek učiteljske uspešnosti in celo presegajo učitelje pri določenih nalogah. Naša koda je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'bo': 'Development and wide use of pretrained language models (PLMs)has been applied to boost their performance on downstream tasks in specific domains, such as biomedical or scientific domains. Additional pre-training with in-domain texts is the most common approach for providing domain-specific knowledge to PLMs. ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་དག་ལ་དུ་གླེང་སྟེགས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་། རང་ཉིད་སྒྲིག ད་དུང་། PLM་གསར་པ་ཞིག་འབྱུང་བའི་སྐབས་ལ་གྲ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དགོས་པ་རེད། In this study, we propose a domain knowledge transferring (DoKTra) framework for PLMs without additional in-domain pretraining. Specifically, we extract the domain knowledge from an existing in-domain pretrained language model and transfer it to other PLMs by applying knowledge distillation. དམིགས་བསལ། ང་ཚོས་ཡིབ་པའི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་ཆེན་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་པའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡོད། We also apply an entropy regularization term in both teacher training and distillation to encourage the model to generate reliable output probabilities, and thus help the distillation. སྔོན་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་DoKTra་གྱི་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ན་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་བྱ ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.', 'jv': 'Dino kaluwargane lan akeh gampang sistem model nggawe luwih(PLM), akeh akeh operasi kapan kanggo nggawe nggawe operasi kapan kuwi tindahan sing wis ngerasai, kaya sistem biyoper sakjane lan sakjane sampeyan. Additional before-tutorial with in-domain texts is the first Common method for Give domain-special information to PLM. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mungkin, kudu kudu mengkin yèng-sangan nguasakno sedhaya kapan PLM sing beraksi. In this test, we proposal a domain knowing transfer (DoKTra) frame for PLMs with additional in-domain presining. CURRENTCURRENT, we extract the domain knowness from an current in Juara-Juara, kéné gunakake interaksi wigaturan pangan (interaksi) sing dipun-ingkang alam sing nganggo aksi layakno sing nguasakno. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi antara Entropy sing di nggawe turungi ampar tentang karo winih dhéwé nggawe modèl kanggo nggawe Perintah sing bisa bantuan ngono nggawe Perintah sing bisa diagonalan tambah nggawe Ngawe nguasai nggawe barang DoKTra kanggo nyebutaké nggawe barang urip ning acara biyo, dadi, alam lan ijol-ijol Awake kode sing dibutuhke ing https://github.com/DMCB-GIST/DoKTra.'}
{'en': 'Clickbait Spoiling via Question Answering and Passage Retrieval', 'ar': 'إنشاء الواقع المضاد الموجه بالاسترجاع لضمان الجودة', 'es': 'Generación contrafáctica guiada por recuperación para control de calidad', 'fr': "Génération contrefactuelle guidée par la récupération pour l'assurance qualité", 'pt': 'Geração contrafactual guiada por recuperação para controle de qualidade', 'ja': 'QAの検索誘導反事実生成', 'zh': '检向者 QA 反事生', 'hi': 'QA के लिए पुनर्प्राप्ति-निर्देशित प्रतिवादी पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Управляемая извлечением встречная генерация для QA', 'ga': 'Giniúint Frithfhíorasach faoi threoir aisghabhála le haghaidh QA', 'ka': 'QA- სთვის მიღებული მხარდაჭერების მიღება', 'hu': 'Visszahívással irányított hamisítvány-generáció a minőségi felügyelethez', 'el': 'Παραγωγή απομίμησης με καθοδήγηση ανάκτησης για τη διασφάλιση της ποιότητας', 'it': 'Generazione contraffatta guidata dal recupero per QA', 'kk': 'QA үшін қарсы тіркесімді алу', 'lt': 'Gavimu pagrįsta suklastota QA generacija', 'mk': 'Генерација за QA, спроведена со преземање', 'ml': 'QA- നുള്ള വീണ്ടും നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലാക്കിയ Counterfactual Generation', 'ms': 'Penjanaan Salah Faktif Dipandang Pemulihan untuk QA', 'mn': 'QA-ын төлөөлөгчийн хувьд авсан Counterfactual Generation for', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni Falsifikata għal QA mmexxija mill-kisba', 'pl': 'Generowanie fałszywych faktów prowadzonych przez odzyskiwanie w celu zapewnienia jakości', 'si': 'Name', 'no': 'Henting av hjelpelinje mot tilbakefaktiske generering for QA', 'so': 'QA', 'sv': 'Hämtningsstyrd varumärkesgenerering för kvalitetssäkring', 'ro': 'Generare contrafăcută ghidată de recuperare pentru QA', 'ta': 'QA க்கான திரும்பப்படுத்தப்பட்ட Counterfactual Generation', 'ur': 'Name', 'sr': 'Povlačena protivnica generacija za QA', 'uz': 'factual generation for QA', 'vi': 'Kiểm tra ngược dữ liệu cho QA', 'bg': 'Създаване на фалшиви факти, ръководени от извличането, за осигуряване на качеството', 'hr': 'Povlačeni protivnik proizvodnje za QA', 'da': 'Hentning- guidet forfalskningsgenerering til QA', 'nl': 'Ophalen geleide vervalsing generatie voor QA', 'id': 'Generasi palsu yang dipandu untuk QA', 'de': 'Abrufgeführte Erzeugung von Fälschungen für die Qualitätssicherung', 'fa': 'نسل\u200cهای حقیقی برای QA راهنمایی به بازیابی', 'ko': 'QA에 대한 검색은 반사실 생성을 유도한다', 'af': 'Herhaal- gids Counterfactual Generation for QA', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi fals i drejtuar nga marrja për QA', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa Nchi inayoongozwa kwa ajili ya QA', 'tr': 'actual Generation for QA', 'am': 'factual generation for QA', 'hy': 'Retrieval-guided Counterfactual Generation for QA', 'az': 'QA 칲칞칲n istifad톛 edil톛n Counterfactual Generation', 'bn': 'QA- র জন্য পুনরুদ্ধার- পরিচালিত কাউন্টারফ্যাক্টেল জেনারেশন', 'bs': 'Povlačena protivnica generacija za QA', 'ca': 'Generació falsa guiada per la obtenció de QA', 'et': 'Kvaliteedi tagamise võltsitud genereerimine', 'cs': 'Vytváření padělaných faktorů s názvem pro QA', 'fi': 'Nouto-ohjattu Counterfact Generation for QA', 'ha': 'factor General for QA', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje ponaredkov, vodeno po pridobivanju, za zagotavljanje kakovosti', 'he': 'דנרציה מזויפת מונחת בחזרה עבור QA', 'jv': 'Actual Generation for qA', 'bo': 'QA རྩིས་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཡར་ལེན་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པའི་མ་ཚད་ངོ་མོའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ལ་བསྐྱར་གསོ'}
{'en': 'We introduce and study the task of clickbait spoiling generating a short text that satisfies the curiosity induced by a clickbait post Clickbait links to a web page and advertises its contents by arousing curiosity instead of providing an informative summary Our contributions are approaches to classify the type of spoiler needed i.e. a phrase or a passage and to generate appropriate spoilers A large scale evaluation and error analysis on a new corpus of 5,000 manually spoiled clickbait posts --- the Webis Clickbait Spoiling Corpus~2022 --shows that our spoiler type classifier achieves an accuracy of~80\\% while the question answering model DeBERTa large outperforms all others in generating spoilers for both types', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية العميقة هشة لاضطرابات المدخلات. أظهر العمل الأخير أن زيادة البيانات باستخدام الحقائق المضادة - أي المدخلات المضطربة إلى الحد الأدنى - يمكن أن تساعد في تخفيف هذا الضعف. نحن نركز على مهمة إنشاء حقائق معاكسة للإجابة على الأسئلة ، والتي تمثل تحديات فريدة تتعلق بالمعرفة العالمية ، والتنوع الدلالي ، والإجابة. لمواجهة هذه التحديات ، قمنا بتطوير تقنية Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) لإنشاء تقييم واقعي وبيانات تدريبية مع الحد الأدنى من الإشراف البشري. باستخدام إطار عمل ضمان الجودة للمجال المفتوح ونموذج إنشاء الأسئلة المدربين على بيانات المهمة الأصلية ، نقوم بإنشاء حقائق معاكسة بطلاقة ومتنوعة لغويًا ومُصنَّفة تلقائيًا. تعمل زيادة البيانات باستخدام الوقائع المضادة لـ RGF على تحسين الأداء في مجموعات التقييم خارج المجال والصعبة بالإضافة إلى الأساليب الحالية ، في كل من فهم القراءة وإعدادات ضمان الجودة للمجال المفتوح. علاوة على ذلك ، وجدنا أن بيانات RGF تؤدي إلى تحسينات كبيرة في متانة النموذج للاضطرابات المحلية.', 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que los modelos de PNL profunda son frágiles a las perturbaciones de entrada. Un trabajo reciente ha demostrado que el aumento de datos mediante contrafácticos, es decir, entradas mínimamente perturbadas, puede ayudar a mejorar esta debilidad. Nos centramos en la tarea de crear contrafácticos para la respuesta a preguntas, lo que presenta desafíos únicos relacionados con el conocimiento mundial, la diversidad semántica y la capacidad de respuesta. Para abordar estos desafíos, desarrollamos una técnica de recuperación, generación, filtro (RGF) para crear datos de evaluación y entrenamiento contrafácticos con una supervisión humana mínima. Utilizando un marco de control de calidad de dominio abierto y un modelo de generación de preguntas entrenado en datos de tareas originales, creamos contrafácticos que son fluidos, semánticamente diversos y se etiquetan automáticamente. El aumento de datos con contrafácticos RGF mejora el rendimiento de los conjuntos de evaluación fuera del dominio y desafiantes por encima de los métodos existentes, tanto en la comprensión de lectura como en los entornos de control de calidad de dominio abierto. Además, descubrimos que los datos de RGF conducen a mejoras significativas en la solidez de un modelo ante las perturbaciones locales.', 'fr': "Les modèles NLP profonds se sont révélés fragiles face aux perturbations d'entrée. Des travaux récents ont montré que l'augmentation des données à l'aide de contrefactuelles, c'est-à-dire des entrées peu perturbées, peut aider à pallier cette faiblesse. Nous nous concentrons sur la tâche de créer des contrefactuels pour répondre aux questions, ce qui présente des défis uniques liés à la connaissance du monde, à la diversité sémantique et à la capacité de répondre. Pour relever ces défis, nous développons une technique de récupération-génération de filtre (RGF) afin de créer des données d'évaluation et de formation contrefactuelles avec un minimum de supervision humaine. À l'aide d'un cadre d'assurance qualité de domaine ouvert et d'un modèle de génération de questions formé sur les données de tâches d'origine, nous créons des contrefactuels fluides, sémantiquement diversifiés et étiquetés automatiquement. L'augmentation des données avec des contrefactuelles RGF améliore les performances sur les ensembles d'évaluation hors domaine et difficiles par rapport aux méthodes existantes, à la fois dans les paramètres de compréhension en lecture et d'assurance qualité dans le domaine ouvert. De plus, nous constatons que les données RGF entraînent des améliorations significatives de la robustesse d'un modèle aux perturbations locales.", 'pt': 'Modelos de PNL profundos têm se mostrado frágeis a perturbações de entrada. Trabalhos recentes mostraram que o aumento de dados usando contrafactuais --- ou seja, entradas minimamente perturbadas --- pode ajudar a melhorar essa fraqueza. Nós nos concentramos na tarefa de criar contrafactuais para responder a perguntas, que apresenta desafios únicos relacionados ao conhecimento do mundo, diversidade semântica e responsabilidade. Para enfrentar esses desafios, desenvolvemos uma técnica Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) para criar avaliação contrafactual e dados de treinamento com supervisão humana mínima. Usando uma estrutura de controle de qualidade de domínio aberto e um modelo de geração de perguntas treinado em dados de tarefas originais, criamos contrafactuais que são fluentes, semanticamente diversos e rotulados automaticamente. O aumento de dados com contrafactuais RGF melhora o desempenho em conjuntos de avaliação desafiadores e fora de domínio, além dos métodos existentes, tanto na compreensão de leitura quanto nas configurações de controle de qualidade de domínio aberto. Além disso, descobrimos que os dados de RGF levam a melhorias significativas na robustez de um modelo a perturbações locais.', 'zh': '深NLP模形已证其扰动为脆弱。 近者研明,用反事实之数增强---即最小扰输---可以助改善之弱。 专为问答创事实,与世相关语义多样性对挑战。 为此挑战,开一检索-生-过滤器(RGF)术,以最少者督创反事实评练数据。 用开域 QA 框架成形,创流语义多样化自标。 观开域 QA 置中,用 RGF 反事实增强功能增域外评集与有挑战性评集之性,超越今法。 此外,见RGF数致局扰者鲁棒性显贵。', 'hi': 'डीप एनएलपी मॉडल को इनपुट गड़बड़ी के लिए भंगुर दिखाया गया है। हाल के काम से पता चला है कि --- प्रतिवादी का उपयोग करके डेटा वृद्धि यानी --- न्यूनतम परेशान इनपुट इस कमजोरी को सुधारने में मदद कर सकते हैं। हम प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए प्रतिवाद बनाने के कार्य पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, जो विश्व ज्ञान, शब्दार्थ विविधता और जवाबदेही से संबंधित अद्वितीय चुनौतियों को प्रस्तुत करता है। इन चुनौतियों का समाधान करने के लिए, हम न्यूनतम मानव पर्यवेक्षण के साथ प्रतिवादात्मक मूल्यांकन और प्रशिक्षण डेटा बनाने के लिए एक पुनर्प्राप्त-जनरेट-फ़िल्टर (RGF) तकनीक विकसित करते हैं। एक ओपन-डोमेन क्यूए फ्रेमवर्क और मूल कार्य डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित प्रश्न जनरेशन मॉडल का उपयोग करके, हम उन प्रतिवादियों को बनाते हैं जो धाराप्रवाह, शब्दार्थ रूप से विविध और स्वचालित रूप से लेबल किए जाते हैं। RGF के साथ डेटा संवर्द्धन counterfactuals आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन पर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है और मौजूदा विधियों के ऊपर और ऊपर चुनौतीपूर्ण मूल्यांकन सेट करता है, दोनों पढ़ने की समझ और ओपन-डोमेन क्यूए सेटिंग्स में। इसके अलावा, हम पाते हैं कि आरजीएफ डेटा एक मॉडल की मजबूती में स्थानीय गड़बड़ी के लिए महत्वपूर्ण सुधार की ओर जाता है।', 'ja': '深部NLPモデルは、入力摂動に対して脆いことが示されている。 最近の研究では、反事実を使用したデータ拡張（すなわち、最小限の摂動を受けた入力）は、この弱点を改善するのに役立つことが示されています。 私たちは、質問に答えるための反事実を作成するタスクに焦点を当てています。これは、世界の知識、意味の多様性、および回答可能性に関連する独自の課題を提示しています。 これらの課題に対処するために、人間の監督を最小限に抑えて事実に反する評価とトレーニングデータを作成するためのリトリーブジェネレートフィルター（ RGF ）技術を開発します。 オープンドメインのQAフレームワークと元のタスクデータでトレーニングされた質問生成モデルを使用して、私たちは流暢で、意味的に多様で、自動的にラベル付けされた反事実を作成します。 RGF反事実を用いたデータ増強は、読み取り理解とオープンドメインのQA設定の両方で、既存の方法よりもドメイン外および挑戦的な評価セットのパフォーマンスを向上させます。 さらに、RGFデータは、局所的な摂動に対するモデルの堅牢性の大幅な改善につながることがわかりました。', 'ru': 'Глубокие модели NLP были показаны как хрупкие для входных возмущений. Недавние исследования показали, что увеличение объема данных с использованием контрфактов, т.е. минимально возмущенных входных данных, может помочь устранить эту слабость. Мы фокусируемся на задаче создания контрфактов для ответов на вопросы, которые представляют уникальные вызовы, связанные с мировыми знаниями, семантическим разнообразием и ответственностью. Для решения этих проблем мы разрабатываем методику Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) для создания контрфактических данных оценки и обучения с минимальным человеческим надзором. Используя фреймворк QA с открытым доменом и модель генерации вопросов, обученную оригинальным данным задачи, мы создаем контрафакты, которые свободно, семантически разнообразны и автоматически помечены. Расширение данных с помощью контрфактов RGF улучшает производительность внедоменных и сложных наборов оценок сверх существующих методов, как в понимании чтения, так и в настройках QA открытого домена. Кроме того, мы обнаружили, что данные RGF приводят к значительному улучшению устойчивости модели к локальным возмущениям.', 'ga': 'Léiríodh go bhfuil múnlaí domhain NLP brionglóideach maidir le suaitheadh ionchuir. Tá sé léirithe ag obair le déanaí gur féidir le méadú sonraí ag baint úsáide as frithfhíorasach --- i.e. ionchuir is lú suaite --- cuidiú leis an laige seo a fheabhsú. Dírímid ar an tasc a bhaineann le frithfhíoras a chruthú chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt, a thugann dúshláin uathúla a bhaineann le heolas an domhain, éagsúlacht shéimeantach, agus freagrúlacht. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na dúshláin seo, forbraímid teicníc Aisghabh-Gin-Filter (RGF) chun sonraí meastóireachta agus oiliúna frithfhíorasacha a chruthú le híosmhéid maoirseachta daonna. Trí úsáid a bhaint as creatlach QA fearainn oscailte agus samhail giniúna ceisteanna atá oilte ar bhunshonraí tascanna, cruthaímid sonraí frithfhíorasacha atá líofa, ilchineálach go semantach, agus lipéadaithe go huathoibríoch. Feabhsaítear feidhmíocht ar thacair mheastóireachta lasmuigh den fhearann agus ar thacair mheastóireachta dhúshlánacha de bhreis ar na modhanna atá ann cheana féin, i socruithe léamhthuisceana agus i socruithe QA an fhearainn oscailte araon, trí mhéadú ar shonraí le sonraí frithfhíorasacha RGF. Ina theannta sin, feicimid go dtagann feabhsuithe suntasacha ar stóinseacht samhail i leith suaiteanna áitiúla mar thoradh ar shonraí RGF.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი NLP მოდელები ჩვენებულია, რომ პერტუბურაციების გადატანა ბრიტულია. ახალი სამუშაო მუშაოდ მონაცემების აგგენტირება გამოყენებაში -- მაგალითად მინიმალურად პერტურბულებული მონაცემები --- შეუძლია დახმარება ამ სიცილი. ჩვენ დავყენებთ მსოფლიო ცნობილებისთვის, სემონტიკური განსხვავებას და პასუხისთვის განსხვავებას, რომელიც მსოფლიო ცნობილებისთვის განსაკუთრებული განსხვავებ ამ გამოცდილებების შესახებ, ჩვენ მინიმალური ადამიანის მონახლებით განვითარებთ ტექნექტიკის გამოყენება, რომელიც განვითარებთ განსაზღვრება და განვითარება მონაცემები. გახსნა დიომინის QA ფრამეტრის და კითხვის შემდეგის მოდელის გამოყენება, რომელიც ორიგინალური დავალების მონაცემებისთვის შევქმნა, ჩვენ შევქმნეთ განსხვავებული განსხვავებული, და ავტომა RGF counterfactuals-თან მონაცემების აგგექტირება დიომინის გარეშე და გარეშე გარეშე მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობა და გარეშე დამატებით, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ RGF მონაცემები იმისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემებისთვის მოდელის ძალადობა ლოკალური პერტურბაციისთვის.', 'hu': 'A mély NLP modellek kimutatták, hogy törékenyek a bemeneti zavarokra. A közelmúltbeli munkák azt mutatták, hogy az ellentények -- azaz minimálisan zavaros bemenetek -- segíthet enyhíteni ezt a gyengeséget. A kérdések megválaszolásához szükséges ellentételek létrehozására összpontosítunk, amelyek a világ tudásával, a szemantikai sokszínűséggel és a válaszolhatósággal kapcsolatos egyedi kihívásokat jelentenek. Ezeknek a kihívásoknak a megoldása érdekében kifejlesztünk egy Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) technikát, amely ellentétes értékelési és képzési adatokat hoz létre minimális emberi felügyelet mellett. Az eredeti feladatadatokra képzett, nyílt tartományú minősítési keretrendszer és kérdésgenerációs modell segítségével folyékony, szemantikailag változatos és automatikusan feliratozott ellentételeket hozunk létre. Az RGF ellentényekkel történő adatbővítés javítja a teljesítményt a domain kívüli és kihívást jelentő értékelési készletek teljesítményét a meglévő módszereken túl, mind az olvasásértésben, mind a nyílt domain QA beállításokban. Ezenkívül úgy találjuk, hogy az RGF adatok jelentős javulást eredményeznek a modell helyi zavarokkal szembeni robusztusságában.', 'el': 'Τα βαθιά μοντέλα έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι είναι εύθραυστα στις διαταραχές εισόδου. Πρόσφατες εργασίες έχουν δείξει ότι η αύξηση δεδομένων με τη χρήση αντιπαραγωγικών στοιχείων --- δηλαδή ελάχιστα διαταραγμένων εισροών --- μπορεί να βοηθήσει στην ανακούφιση αυτής της αδυναμίας. Εστιάζουμε στο έργο της δημιουργίας αντιπαραγωγικών για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων, η οποία παρουσιάζει μοναδικές προκλήσεις που σχετίζονται με την παγκόσμια γνώση, τη σημασιολογική ποικιλομορφία και την ικανότητα απάντησης. Για να αντιμετωπίσουμε αυτές τις προκλήσεις, αναπτύσσουμε μια τεχνική ανάκτησης-δημιουργίας-φίλτρου (για τη δημιουργία αντικαταρκτικών δεδομένων αξιολόγησης και κατάρτισης με ελάχιστη ανθρώπινη επίβλεψη. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα ανοικτό πλαίσιο QA και μοντέλο δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων εκπαιδευμένο σε πρωτότυπα δεδομένα εργασιών, δημιουργούμε αντιφατικά στοιχεία που είναι άπταιστα, σημασιολογικά διαφορετικά και αυτόματα επισημαίνονται. Η αύξηση δεδομένων με αντιπραγματικά στοιχεία βελτιώνει την απόδοση σε εκτός πεδίου και απαιτητικά σύνολα αξιολόγησης πέρα από τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους, τόσο στην κατανόηση ανάγνωσης όσο και στις ρυθμίσεις ανοικτού τομέα QA. Επιπλέον, διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα δεδομένα οδηγούν σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην ανθεκτικότητα ενός μοντέλου σε τοπικές διαταραχές.', 'lt': 'Nustatyta, kad gilūs NLP modeliai yra silpni, kad galėtų sukelti perturbacijas. Neseniai atliktas darbas parodė, kad duomenų didinimas naudojant priešingus faktus -- t. y. mažiausiai sutrikdytus duomenis -- gali padėti pagerinti šį silpnumą. Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame uždaviniui sukurti priešingus faktus atsakymui į klausimus, kurie kelia unikalius iššūkius, susijusius su pasaulio žiniomis, semantine įvairove ir atsakomybe. To address these challenges, we develop a Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) technique to create counterfactual evaluation and training data with minimal human supervision.  Naudodami atviros srities QA sistemą ir klausimų generavimo model į, parengtą remiantis pradiniais užduočių duomenimis, sukuriame priešingus faktus, kurie yra lanksčiai, semantiškai įvairūs ir automatiškai paženklinti. Duomenų didinimas naudojant RGF priešingus faktus pagerina ne srities ir sunkių vertinimo rinkinių rezultatus, viršijančius esamus metodus, tiek skaitymo supratimo, tiek atviros srities QA nustatymuose. Be to, manome, kad RGF duomenys labai pagerina modelio patikimumą vietos perturbacijoms.', 'it': "I modelli NLP profondi hanno dimostrato di essere fragili alle perturbazioni in ingresso. Recenti lavori hanno dimostrato che l'aumento dei dati utilizzando elementi controfattuali --- cioè input minimamente perturbati --- può contribuire a migliorare questa debolezza. Ci concentriamo sul compito di creare controfattuali per la risposta alle domande, che presenta sfide uniche legate alla conoscenza del mondo, alla diversità semantica e alla risposta. Per affrontare queste sfide, sviluppiamo una tecnica Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) per creare dati controfattuali di valutazione e formazione con la minima supervisione umana. Utilizzando un framework QA open-domain e un modello di generazione di domande addestrato sui dati di attività originali, creiamo controfattuali fluenti, semanticamente diversi e etichettati automaticamente. L'aumento dei dati con controfattuali RGF migliora le prestazioni su set di valutazione fuori dominio e impegnativi oltre ai metodi esistenti, sia nella comprensione della lettura che nelle impostazioni di QA open-domain. Inoltre, troviamo che i dati RGF portano a miglioramenti significativi nella robustezza di un modello alle perturbazioni locali.", 'kk': 'NLP үлгілері келтірілген терістер үшін көп болып көрсетілді. Жуырдағы жұмыс көмегімен деректерді көмегімен көмегімен көрсетеді --- мысалы, төменгі қиындық келтірілген келтірілген келтірілген келтірілген келтірілген келтірілгендер --- бұл жа Біз сұрақ жауап беру үшін жалғыз мәселелерді құру тапсырмасына көңіл береміз. Бұл әлемдік білім, семантикалық әртүрлі және жауап беру үшін бірнеше мәселеле Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, бақылау және оқыту деректерін төменгі адамдарды бақылау үшін қарсы оқу және оқыту техникасын құрамыз. QA қоршау және бастапқы тапсырма деректеріне оқылған сұрақ құру үлгісін қолдану үлгісін қолданып, біз жылдамдық, semantiкалық түрлі және автоматты түрде белгіленген қалпындық нәтиже RGF мәліметтерімен деректерді көбейту доменге шығыс және бар әдістердің арқылы оқу және ашылған доменге QA параметрлерінде жұмыс істеу жүйесін жасайды. Қосымша, RGF деректері үлгісінің жергілікті ауруларға күшті жақсартылығын түсіндіреді.', 'mk': 'Длабоките НЛП модели се покажаа дека се слаби за внесување на пречки. Неодамнешната работа покажа дека зголемувањето на податоците користејќи контрафактични резултати -- т.е. минимално вознемирени внесувања -- може да помогне во подобрувањето на оваа слабост. Ние се фокусираме на задачата да создадеме контрафакти за одговори на прашања, кои претставуваат уникатни предизвици поврзани со светското знаење, семантичната различност и одговорност. За да ги решиме овие предизвици, ние развиваме техника за преземање- генерирање- филтер( RGF) за создавање контрафактична проценка и обука на податоци со минимален човеков надзор. Користејќи рамка за QA на отворен домен и модел за генерација на прашања обучен на оригинални податоци за задачи, создаваме контрафакти кои се течни, семантички различни и автоматски означени. Разголемувањето на податоците со контрафактичните резултати на RGF ја подобрува резултатот на поставувањата надвор од домен и предизвикувањата на поставувањата над постоечките методи, како во разбирањето на читањето, така и во поставувањата на QA на отворен домен. Покрај тоа, сметаме дека податоците на РГФ водат до значителни подобрувања во силноста на моделот кон локалните пертурбирања.', 'ms': 'Model NLP yang dalam telah dipaparkan menjadi lemah untuk masukan gangguan. Kerja baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahawa peningkatan data menggunakan barang-barang kontrafaktual -- iaitu input yang sedikit terganggu -- boleh membantu memperbaiki kelemahan ini. Kami fokus pada tugas mencipta kontrafakta untuk menjawab soalan, yang menghasilkan cabaran unik berkaitan dengan pengetahuan dunia, kebanyakan semantik, dan kelayakan jawapan. Untuk menangani cabaran ini, kami mengembangkan teknik Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) untuk mencipta penilaian dan latihan bertentangan dengan pengawasan manusia minimal. Mengguna kerangka QA domain terbuka dan model generasi soalan dilatih pada data tugas asal, kami mencipta kontrafaktal yang mudah, berbeza secara semantik, dan secara automatik ditabel. Peningkatan data dengan kontrafaktal RGF meningkatkan prestasi pada tetapan penilaian luar-domain dan tantangan tetapan penilaian lebih dan lebih daripada kaedah yang wujud, dalam kedua-dua pemahaman pembacaan dan tetapan QA domain terbuka. Selain itu, kami mendapati bahawa data RGF membawa kepada peningkatan yang signifikan dalam kuasa model kepada gangguan tempatan.', 'mn': 'НЛП-ын гүн гүнзгий загварууд нь пертурбацийн оролцоонд хүндрэлтэй болж харагдаж байна. Саяхан ажиллаж байгаагаар өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт нь хуурамч хүмүүсийг ашиглаж байгааг харуулсан. Яг л хамгийн бага зэрэг хөгжүүлсэн орнууд--- энэ сул байдлыг сайжруулж чадна. Бид асуулт хариултын хувьд буруу бодлогыг бий болгох даалгавар дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Энэ нь дэлхийн мэдлэгтэй, semantic олон төрлийн, хариулт үйлдэлтэй холбоотой өөр нэг сорилтуудыг хар Эдгээр сорилтуудыг зохицуулахын тулд бид хүн төрөлхтний бага зэрэг дүгнэлт болон сургалтын өгөгдлийг бүтээх боломжтой Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) техникийг хөгжүүлнэ. Нээлтэй холбоотой QA хэлбэрийг ашиглаж, асуулт гаргах загварыг эхний ажлын өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын загвар ашиглаж, бид шингэн, semantique олон, автоматаар нэрлэгдсэн худалдааныг бүтээж байна. RGF хуурамч хүмүүстэй өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт нь хоорондоо унших болон нээлттэй холбоотой QA тохиолдолд ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг. Мөн бид RGF өгөгдлийн санаа загварын хүчтэй байдалд орон нутгийн эргэлтэй хүчээр чухал сайжруулах боломжтой болж байна.', 'no': 'Djupne NLP- modeller er vist som brittlar for inndataperturbasjonar. Nyleg har arbeidet vist at dataaugmentasjonen ved hjelp av vilkårleg - - t.d. minst forsterkte inndata --- kan hjelpa til å gjenoppretta denne svakheta. Vi fokuserer på oppgåva om å laga vilkårleg for å svara på spørsmål, som fører til unike utfordringar relaterte til verdenskjenning, semantisk mangfolding og svarability. For å handtera desse utfordringane, utviklar vi ein teknikk for å laga vilkårleg evaluering og opplæring av data med minimalt menneskeovervaking. Bruk eit open-domain QA-rammeverket og spørsmål-genereringsmodell trent på opphavsdata, oppretter vi vilkårleg som er fluent, semantisk diverse og automatisk merkelapp. Data-augmentasjon med RGF-vilkårleg forbetrar utføringar på uten domene og vanskeleg evalueringssett over og over eksisterande metodar i både lesingsforståelse og open-domain QA-innstillingane. I tillegg finn vi at RGF-data fører til signifikante forbedringar i modellen til lokale turbasjonar.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że modele głębokiego NLP są kruche na zakłócenia wejściowe. Ostatnie prace wykazały, że powiększanie danych przy użyciu metod kontrafaktowych --- czyli minimalnie zakłóconych danych --- może pomóc zmniejszyć tę słabość. Skupiamy się na zadaniu tworzenia kontrafaktów do odpowiedzi na pytania, które stanowią unikalne wyzwania związane z wiedzą świata, różnorodnością semantyczną i odpowiedzialnością. Aby sprostać tym wyzwaniom, opracowujemy technikę Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF), która umożliwia tworzenie kontrfaktycznych danych oceny i szkoleń przy minimalnym nadzorze człowieka. Korzystając z otwartej domeny framework QA i modelu generowania pytań, przeszkolonego na oryginalnych danych zadań, tworzymy kontrafakty, które są płynne, semantycznie zróżnicowane i automatycznie etykietowane. Powiększanie danych za pomocą kontrafactyków RGF poprawia wydajność w przypadku poza domeną i trudnych zestawów oceny ponad istniejące metody, zarówno w zakresie zrozumienia odczytu, jak i otwartej domeny jakości. Ponadto stwierdzono, że dane RGF prowadzą do znaczącej poprawy solidności modelu na zakłócenia lokalne.', 'ro': 'S-a demonstrat că modelele NLP profunde sunt fragile la perturbațiile de intrare. Lucrările recente au arătat că mărirea datelor utilizând elemente contrafactuale --- adică intrări perturbate minim --- poate contribui la ameliorarea acestei slăbiciuni. Ne concentrăm pe sarcina de a crea contrafactuale pentru răspunsul la întrebări, care prezintă provocări unice legate de cunoașterea mondială, diversitatea semantică și răspunderea. Pentru a aborda aceste provocări, dezvoltăm o tehnică Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) pentru a crea date contrafactuale de evaluare și formare cu supraveghere umană minimă. Folosind un cadru QA cu domeniu deschis și un model de generare a întrebărilor instruit pe datele originale ale sarcinilor, creăm contrafactuale fluente, diverse semantic și etichetate automat. Augmentarea datelor cu contrafactualități RGF îmbunătățește performanța seturilor de evaluare în afara domeniului și provocări, peste și peste metodele existente, atât în înțelegerea citirii, cât și în setările de QA open-domain. Mai mult decât atât, constatăm că datele RGF duc la îmbunătățiri semnificative în robustețea unui model la perturbațiile locale.', 'mt': 'Intwera li mudelli profondi tal-NLP huma dgħajfa biex jintroduċu perturbazzjonijiet. Xogħol reċenti wera li ż-żieda fid-dejta bl-użu ta » kontrafattwali --- jiġifieri inputs li huma minimament imfixkla --- tista » tgħin biex din id-dgħjufija titjieb. Aħna niffokaw fuq il-kompitu li nħolqu kontrofattwali għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, li jippreżentaw sfidi uniċi relatati mal-għarfien dinji, id-diversità semantika, u r-responsabbiltà. Biex nindirizzaw dawn l-isfidi, a ħna niżviluppaw teknika ta’ Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) biex inħolqu evalwazzjoni kontrofattwali u dejta ta’ taħriġ b’superviżjoni minima tal-bniedem. Bl-użu ta’ qafas ta’ QA ta’ dominju miftuħ u mudell ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet imħarreġ fuq dejta oriġinali tal-kompiti, aħna nħolqu kontrofattwali li huma fluwenti, semantikament differenti, u awtomatikament ittikkettati. Iż-żieda fid-dejta b’kontrofattwali tal-RGF ittejjeb il-prestazzjoni fuq settijiet ta’ evalwazzjoni barra d-dominju u ta’ sfida fuq il-metodi eżistenti, kemm fil-komprensjoni tal-qari kif ukoll fl-istabbilimenti ta’ QA ta’ dominju miftuħ. Barra minn hekk, isibu li d-dejta tal-RGF twassal għal titjib sinifikanti fir-robustezza ta’ mudell għall-perturbazzjonijiet lokali.', 'sr': 'Pokazali su da su duboki NLP modeli veliki za ulazak perturbacija. Poslednji rad pokazao je da povećanje podataka koristeći greške -- to je minimalno uznemireni ulaz --- može pomoći da poboljšava ovu slabost. Fokusiramo se na zadatak stvaranja krivotvornih reakcija na odgovor na pitanje, koji predstavlja jedinstvene izazove povezane sa svetskim znanjem, semantičkom raznolikošću i odgovornošću. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, razvili smo tehniku proizvodnje filtra (RGF) za stvaranje lažnih podataka o procjeni i obuci sa minimalnim ljudskim nadzorom. Koristeći okvir otvorenog domena QA i model generacije pitanja obučen na originalnim podacima zadataka, stvorimo vile faktore koje su tekuće, semantički različite i automatski označene. Povećavanje podataka sa grešnim delovima RGF-a poboljšava učinkovitost na izvan domena i izazovnim setima procjene iznad i iznad postojećih metoda, i u razumijevanju čitanja i postavljanju otvorenog domena QA-a. Nadalje, nalazimo da podaci RGF vode do značajnih poboljšanja model a u robustnosti lokalnih perturbacija.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් NLP මෝඩේල් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්. අලුත් වැඩේ පෙන්වන්නේ විසින් දත්ත වැඩියුම් විසින් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය --- ඉතින් අඩුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය --- මේ  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන වැඩේ අවධානය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ලෝක දන්නවත්, සෙමාන්තික විවිධානය,  මේ අභ්\u200dයානයක් විස්තර කරන්න, අපි අඩුම මිනිස්සු බලන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් සමග ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර කරනවා. ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩක් දත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණයක් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදි RGF සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂයෙන් තොරතුරු විශාලනය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශාලනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශාලනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශාලනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ තවත්, අපි හොයාගන්නවා RGF දත්ත තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ගැන ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරමාණයකට වැඩි වැඩ කරන්න.', 'so': "Tusaalada NLP ee mool dheer waxaa looga muujiyey in lagu sameeyo qalloocan. Shaqoda la soo dhowaaday waxay muuqatay in kordhinta macluumaadka lagu isticmaali karo qof ka soo jeeda-- Waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa shaqada abuuridda dib u dhigista jawaabta su'aalaha, taasoo keena dhibaatooyin gaar ah oo la xiriira aqoonta caalamiga, kala duwanaanshaha kala duduwan iyo jawaabta. To address these challenges, we develop a Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) technique to create counterfactual evaluation and training data with minimal human supervision.  Isku isticmaalaya muusiko QA oo furan iyo muusiko su'aal ah oo lagu tababaray taariikhda asalka ah, waxaynu abuurnaa counterfactuals that are fluid, semantik kala duduwan, oo si rasmi ah loo isticmaalo. Isku daryeelka macluumaadka oo ku qoran RGF-ka-hor-dhigyada wuxuu bedeshaa tababarka ka baxa domain-ka iyo qiimeynta qiimeynta caadiga ah oo ka sarreeya qaababka ku jira iyo qoraalka ku qoran karsashada QA. Sidoo kale waxaynu helnaa in macluumaadka RGF uu ku hoggaamiyo hagaajinta muusikada oo uu ku sameeyo qalabka degmada.", 'sv': 'Djupa NLP-modeller har visat sig vara sköra för inmatningsproblem. Nyligen utförda arbeten har visat att dataförstärkning med hjälp av kontrafakta --- dvs. minimalt störda indata --- kan bidra till att mildra denna svaghet. Vi fokuserar på uppgiften att skapa kontrafakta för frågeställning, vilket innebär unika utmaningar relaterade till världskunskap, semantisk mångfald och svarbarhet. För att möta dessa utmaningar utvecklar vi en Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) teknik för att skapa kontrafaktisk utvärdering och träningsdata med minimal mänsklig övervakning. Med hjälp av ett open-domain QA-ramverk och frågegenereringsmodell utbildad på originaluppgifter skapar vi kontrafakta som är flytande, semantiskt varierande och automatiskt märkta. Dataförstärkning med RGF-kontrafakta förbättrar prestandan på out-of-domain och utmanande utvärderingar utöver befintliga metoder, både i läsförståelse och QA-inställningar för öppen domän. Dessutom finner vi att RGF-data leder till betydande förbättringar i en modells robusthet mot lokala störningar.', 'ta': 'ஆழமான NLP மாதிரிகள் உள்ளீட்டு பிரச்சனைகளை உள்ளிடுவதற்கு சிரிட்டில் காட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது. சமீபத்தில் உள்ள வேலை காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது எதிர்பார்வைகளை பயன்படுத்தி தகவல் கூட்டுதல் - அதாவது, குறைந்தபட்ச குறைந்தபட்ச குறைந்த கேள்விக்கு பதில் நாம் எதிர்காரணிகளை உருவாக்க வேண்டும் செயலை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். அது உலக அறிவு, பாதிப்பு வேறுபாடு மற்றும்  இந்த சவால்களை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க, நாம் சிறிய மனித கண்காணிப்புடன் மீட்டெடுக்க- உருவாக்கும் வடிகட்டி தொழில்நுட்பம் உருவாக்குக ஒரு திறந்த களம் QA சட்டத்தையும் கேள்வி உருவாக்கும் மாதிரி முறைமையையும் பயன்படுத்தி மூலம் பணி தரவில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, மேலும்  Data augmentation with RGF counterfactuals improves performance on out-of-domain and challenging evaluation sets over and above existing methods, in both the reading comprehension and open-domain QA settings.  மேலும், RGF தகவல்கள் ஒரு மாதிரியின் ஆட்டத்தில் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கிறது உள்ளார்ந்த சுழற்', 'ur': 'اندھیرے NLP موڈل دکھائے گئے ہیں کہ اینپیٹ پرٹربیٹ کیے جاتے ہیں۔ اچھا کام دکھایا گیا ہے کہ ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنا گناہ فعل کے مطابق ہے --- یعنی حد سے کم مشکل اضافہ ہونے والی اضافہ --- اس کمزوری کو اضافہ کرنا مدد کر سکتا ہے. ہم نے سؤال جواب کے لئے مختلف فرق بنانے کے کام پر تمرکز کیا ہے جو دنیا کی علم، سیمانٹی مختلف اور جواب دینے کے باعث مختلف چالیں پیش کرتا ہے۔ ان چالوں کے بارے میں ہم نے کمترین انسان کی نظر سے ایک پھیرنے-جوانی-فیلٹر(RGF) ٹیکنیک پیدا کیا ہے کہ انصاف کا ارزش اور تربیت ڈیٹا پیدا کریں۔ اوپن ڈومین QA فرمیٹ اور سؤال کی نسل موڈل کو استعمال کرتا ہے جو اصلی ٹوکیٹ ڈاٹ پر آموزش کی گئی ہے، ہم مختلف موجودات بناتے ہیں جو فلان ہیں، سیمنٹی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے ہیں، اور اپنے ساتھ لیبل کیا جاتا ہے RGF counterfactuals کے ساتھ ڈاٹ افزایش ڈومین کے بیرون سے اور موجود طریقے پر مشکل ارزیابی سٹ اور اوپر سے، پڑھنے کی سمجھ اور کھولنے والی ڈومین QA سیٹیوں میں فعالیت بہتر کرتی ہے. اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ RGF ڈیٹا ایک موڈل کی مضبوطی میں بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ NLP മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ചെറുതാക്കുന്നതിനായി കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. Recent work has shown that data augmentation using counterfactuals --- i.e. minimally perturbed inputs --- can help ameliorate this weakness.  ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനായി നമ്മുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. അത് ലോകത്തിന്റെ അറിവ്, സെമാന്റിക്ക് വ് ഈ വിലപാടുകളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു റിവീവ്-ജനിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഫില്\u200dറ്റര്\u200d സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200d ഒരു തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ക്യൂഎ ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ആദ്യമായ ജോലി ഡേറ്റായില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യാപ്തി Name അതുകൊണ്ട് നമുക്ക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് RGF ഡേറ്റാകള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ വസ്ത്രത്തിലേക്ക് വലിയ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda ishni ko'rsatish mumkin, counterfaktalar yordamida maʼlumot qoʻshish qoʻshilishi - -- m'aha, kichkina qo'llangan tarkiblar --- bu svakhligni qaytarishga yordam berishi mumkin. Biz savol javob berish uchun foydalanuvchilarni yaratishga qaramamiz. Bu muammolar dunyoning илм, semantik tarqatish va javob beradi. Bu muammolarni talab qilish uchun biz oddiy oddiy inson taʼminlovchi sohasini yaratish va taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni yaratish uchun qayta chiqarish filteri (RGF) tugmasini yaratishmiz. Name Name Ko'rib, biz RGF haqida maʼlumotlar modelning o'zgarishga muhim yaxshi o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình Deep NLP đã thấy là rất giòn với phiền to ái trong nhà nhập. Những nghiên cứu gần đây đã cho thấy việc gia tăng dữ liệu sử dụng các nhân tố ngược... tức là các nội dung bất động nhỏ... có thể giúp cải thiện yếu đi ểm này. Chúng tôi tập trung vào nhiệm vụ tạo phản nhân để trả lời câu hỏi, nó đưa ra những thử thách độc đáo liên quan đến kiến thức thế giới, sự đa dạng đơn giản và trả lời. Để đối phó với những thử thách này, chúng tôi phát triển một kỹ thuật đương tạo Bộ lọc đương tạo (RGF) để tạo ra các dữ liệu đánh giá ngược và đào tạo với mức giám sát con người tối thiểu. Sử dụng hệ thống QA mở miền và mẫu câu hỏi được đào tạo trên dữ liệu nhiệm vụ gốc, chúng tôi tạo ra các đối tác có tính chất thông thạo, theo ngữ nghĩa rộng, và tự động được đánh dấu. Việc gia tăng dữ liệu với các nhân vật lí RGF cải thiện lợi thế của các phương pháp đánh giá vượt ra khỏi miền và thử thách được so với các phương pháp có sẵn, trong thiết lập QA dễ hiểu và được mở rộng. Chúng tôi thấy rằng dữ liệu RGF dẫn đến những cải tiến đáng kể về s ự bền vững của mô hình với phiền phức địa phương.', 'da': 'Dybe NLP modeller har vist sig at være skrøbelige over for input forstyrrelser. Det seneste arbejde har vist, at dataforøgelse ved hjælp af kontrafaktuelle elementer --- dvs. minimalt forstyrrede input --- kan bidrage til at afhjælpe denne svaghed. Vi fokuserer på opgaven med at skabe kontrafaktuelle oplysninger til spørgsmålsbesvarelse, som stiller unikke udfordringer relateret til verdenskendskab, semantisk mangfoldighed og ansvarlighed. For at løse disse udfordringer udvikler vi en Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) teknik til at skabe kontrafaktuelle evaluerings- og træningsdata med minimal menneskelig tilsyn. Ved hjælp af en open-domain QA framework og spørgsmålstegnelsesmodel trænet på originale opgavedata skaber vi kontrafaktuelle oplysninger, der er flydende, semantisk forskelligartede og automatisk mærkede. Dataforøgelse med RGF kontrafaktuelle data forbedrer ydeevnen på uden for domænet og udfordrende evalueringssæt ud over eksisterende metoder, både i læseforståelse og open-domain QA indstillinger. Desuden finder vi, at RGF data fører til betydelige forbedringer i en models robusthed over for lokale forstyrrelser.', 'hr': 'Pokazali su da su duboki NLP modeli veliki za ulazak perturbacija. Skorašnji rad pokazao je da povećanje podataka koristeći kontrafaktualne -- tj. minimalno uznemirene ulaznice --- može pomoći da poboljšava ovu slabost. Usredotočili smo se na zadatak stvaranja lažnih djelovanja na odgovor na pitanje, koji predstavlja jedinstvene izazove povezane sa svjetskim znanjem, semantičkom raznolikošću i odgovornošću. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, razvijamo tehniku proizvodnje filtra (RGF) za stvaranje lažnih podataka o procjeni i obuci s minimalnim ljudskim nadzorom. Koristeći okvir otvorenog domena QA i model generacije pitanja obučen na originalnim podacima zadatka, stvorimo vile faktore koji su tekući, semantički različiti i automatski označeni. Povećavanje podataka s pogrešnim položajima RGF-a poboljšava učinkovitost na izvan domena i izazovnim postavljanjima procjene iznad postojećih metoda, kako u razumijevanju čitanja i postavljanju QA-a otvorenog domena. Osim toga, smatramo da podaci RGF dovedu do značajnih poboljšanja u robustnosti model a do lokalnih perturbacija.', 'bg': 'Дълбоките модели на НЛП са показани, че са крехки към входните смущения. Последните изследвания показват, че увеличаването на данните, използвайки контрафакти -- т.е. минимално смущени входове -- може да помогне за подобряване на тази слабост. Фокусираме се върху задачата да създадем контрафакти за отговор на въпроси, които представят уникални предизвикателства, свързани със световното познание, семантичното разнообразие и отговорността. За да се справим с тези предизвикателства, ние разработваме техника за създаване на контрафактически данни за оценка и обучение с минимален човешки надзор. Използвайки отворена рамка за контрол на качеството и модел за генериране на въпроси, обучен върху оригинални данни за задачите, създаваме контрафакти, които са плавни, семантично разнообразни и автоматично етикетирани. Увеличаването на данните с контрафакти подобрява ефективността при извъндомейнни и предизвикателни оценки над съществуващите методи, както в настройките за разбиране на четенето, така и в настройките за оценка на качеството в отворен домейн. Освен това откриваме, че данните водят до значителни подобрения в здравината на модела спрямо местните смущения.', 'nl': 'Diepe NLP modellen zijn broos gebleken voor input verstoringen. Recent onderzoek heeft aangetoond dat data augmentatie met behulp van contrafacticals --- d.w.z. minimaal gestoorde inputs --- kan helpen deze zwakte te verlichten. We richten ons op de taak van het creëren van contrafacticals voor het beantwoorden van vragen, die unieke uitdagingen met betrekking tot wereldkennis, semantische diversiteit en responsability biedt. Om deze uitdagingen aan te pakken, ontwikkelen we een Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF)-techniek om contrafactische evaluatie- en trainingsgegevens te creëren met minimale menselijke supervisie. Met behulp van een open-domein QA framework en vragengeneratie model getraind op originele taakgegevens, creëren we contrafacticals die vloeiend, semantisch divers en automatisch gelabeld zijn. Data augmentatie met RGF contrafacticals verbetert de prestaties op out-of-domain en uitdagende evaluatiesets boven en boven bestaande methoden, zowel in het leesbegrip als in open-domain QA-instellingen. Bovendien vinden we dat RGF data leidt tot significante verbeteringen in de robuustheid van een model voor lokale storingen.', 'de': 'Deep NLP Modelle haben sich als spröde gegenüber Eingangsstörungen erwiesen. Neuere Arbeiten haben gezeigt, dass eine Datenaufwertung mit kontrafaktischen Daten --- d.h. minimal gestörten Eingaben --- helfen kann, diese Schwäche zu lindern. Wir konzentrieren uns auf die Aufgabe, kontrafaktische Fragestellungen zu erstellen, die einzigartige Herausforderungen im Zusammenhang mit Weltwissen, semantischer Vielfalt und Antwortbarkeit darstellen. Um diesen Herausforderungen gerecht zu werden, entwickeln wir eine Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF)-Technik, um kontrafaktische Auswertungs- und Trainingsdaten mit minimaler menschlicher Überwachung zu erstellen. Mit Hilfe eines offenen QA-Frameworks und eines Fragegenerierungsmodells, das auf ursprünglichen Aufgabendaten trainiert wurde, erstellen wir kontrafaktische Fakten, die fließend, semantisch vielfältig und automatisch beschriftet sind. Die Datenerweiterung mit RGF-Kontrafaktiken verbessert die Leistung von außerhalb der Domäne liegenden und herausfordernden Evaluationssets über bestehende Methoden hinaus, sowohl im Leseverständnis als auch im Open-Domain-QA-Setting. Darüber hinaus finden wir, dass RGF-Daten zu signifikanten Verbesserungen der Robustheit eines Modells gegenüber lokalen Störungen führen.', 'id': 'Model NLP yang dalam telah menunjukkan menjadi lemah untuk memasukkan perturbasi. Pekerjaan baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa peningkatan data menggunakan kontrafaktal -- i.e. input minimal terganggu -- dapat membantu memperbaiki kelemahan ini. Kami fokus pada tugas menciptakan kontrafaktal untuk menjawab pertanyaan, yang menunjukkan tantangan unik yang berhubungan dengan pengetahuan dunia, diversitas semantis, dan jawaban. Untuk mengatasi tantangan-tantangan ini, kami mengembangkan teknik Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) untuk menciptakan evaluasi kontrofaksi dan data latihan dengan pengawasan manusia minimal. Menggunakan rangka QA domain terbuka dan model generasi pertanyaan dilatih pada data tugas asli, kami menciptakan kontrofaksi yang fluent, semantis berbeda, dan otomatis ditabel. Peningkatan data dengan kontrafaktal RGF meningkatkan prestasi di luar domain dan menantang evaluasi set lebih dan lebih dari metode yang ada, dalam kedua pemahaman pembacaan dan pengaturan QA domain terbuka. Selain itu, kami menemukan bahwa data RGF mengarah kepada peningkatan yang signifikan dalam kekuatan model untuk perturbasi lokal.', 'ko': '깊이 NLP 모델은 입력 교란에 취약하다는 것이 증명되었다.최근의 연구에 따르면 반사실(즉 최소 교란 입력)을 사용하여 데이터를 늘리는 것이 이 약점을 개선하는 데 도움이 된다고 한다.우리는 문답을 위해 반사실을 창조하는 임무에 전념했는데 이것은 세계 지식, 의미의 다양성과 대답성에 독특한 도전을 던졌다.이러한 도전에 대응하기 위해 최소한의 인공 감독 아래 반사실 평가와 훈련 데이터를 만드는 검색 생성필터(RGF) 기술을 개발했다.개방된 영역의 QA 프레임워크와 원시 임무 데이터 훈련을 바탕으로 하는 문제 생성 모델을 사용하여 우리는 유창하고 의미가 다양하며 자동으로 표시되는 반사실을 만들었다.읽기 이해 및 개방 분야 QA 설정에서는 기존 방법보다 RGF를 활용한 반사실 데이터 강화로 영역 밖과 도전적인 평가집의 성능이 향상됐다.또한 RGF 데이터가 모델이 부분적으로 교란하는 루팡성을 크게 높인 것으로 나타났습니다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای عمیق NLP نشان داده شده\u200cاند که برای ورودی تبدیل\u200cکننده\u200cها درخشان است. کارهای اخیرا نشان داده است که افزایش داده\u200cها با استفاده از ضعیف\u200cها --- یعنی اندازه\u200cی کمترین اندازه\u200cهای درگیر شده --- می\u200cتواند کمک کند که این ضعیف را افزایش دهد. ما روی کار ایجاد کردن دروغگویی برای جواب سوال تمرکز می کنیم که این چالش های متفاوتی که مربوط به دانش جهان هستند، مختلف فرق و جواب می دهند. برای حل این چالش\u200cها، ما یک تکنیک بازیافت-فیلتر(RGF) را برای ایجاد ارزیابی و آموزش داده\u200cهای خلاف حقیقت با بررسی کمتری انسان توسعه می\u200cکنیم. استفاده از یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ افزایش داده\u200cها با برعکس\u200cهای RGF، عملکرد روی خارج از دومین و تنظیم ارزیابی سخت\u200cگیری بر و بالای روش\u200cهای موجود، در هر دو درک خواندن و تنظیمات QA دامین باز را بهتر می\u200cکند. بعلاوه این، ما فهمیدیم که داده های RGF به سوی بهترین شدید توسط استعداد یک مدل به تبدیل محلی رهبری می کند.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa ndani wa NLP umeonyesha kuwa vigumu kwa ajili ya kutengeneza matatizo. Kazi ya hivi karibuni imeonyesha kwamba kuongezeka kwa takwimu kwa kutumia watu wanaopinga --- yaani vifaa vinavyochapishwa kidogo --- vinaweza kusaidia kupunguza udhaifu huu. Tunashughulikia jukumu la kutengeneza wajibu wa maswali, ambalo linaleta changamoto za kipekee zinazohusiana na maarifa ya dunia, tofauti za kidini na wajibu. Ili kukabiliana na changamoto hizi, tunatengeneza teknolojia ya Uzalishaji-Uzalishaji (RGF) ili kutengeneza taarifa za uchunguzi na mafunzo kwa ufuatiliaji wa kidogo wa binadamu. Kwa kutumia miundombinu ya wazi ya QA na muundo wa kizazi cha maswali uliojifundishwa kwa taarifa za mwanzo za kazi, tunatengeneza vifaa vinavyochanganyika, tofauti na tofauti, na kwa kujitegemea. Data augmentation with RGF counterfactuals improves performance on out-of-domain and challenging evaluation sets over and above existing methods, in both the reading comprehension and open-domain QA settings.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunagundua kuwa taarifa za RGF zinapelekea maendeleo makubwa katika uvunjifu wa mifano kwa ukatili wa maeneo.', 'tr': 'Ullanyş NLP nusgalary gaýd edip görkezildi. Ýakyndaky i şleriň maglumaty faýllary ulanyp maglumaty ýetişdirilip görkezildi --- iň. iň azyndan çarpylýan girişimler --- bu ýaraýyklygy üýtgetmekde kömek edip biler. Biz soragyň jogap bermegi üçin daňlap çözgütler döretmäge üns berýäris. Bu dünýäde bilgi, semantik çarpyşlyklar we jogap bermegi bilen meňzeş kynçylyklary getirýär. Bu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin, azajyk ynsan gözezçiligi bilen soňsuz deňlemek we paýlamak üçin, Taýdalan-Taýdalan-Filter(RGF) teknikini geliştirdik. Açık-domain QA çerçevesini ve soru jeneratma modelini orijinal görev verileri üzerinde eğitilen, fluent, semantik çeşitli ve otomatik etiketlenen sayıları oluşturuyoruz. RGF counterfactuals bilen maglumat gaýşartmaky işlemlerini offof-domain we çözgüçli deňlenme setirlerini hem bolan yönlerde, hem okamak hem aç-domeny QA düzümlerini gowaraýar. Mundan soňra, RGF maglumaty nusgasynda ýerli çarpaklaryň güýçlidigine örän gowurak getirýär.', 'sq': 'Modelet e thella të NLP janë treguar të dobëta për të hyrë në perturbacione. Puna e fundit ka treguar se rritja e të dhënave duke përdorur kontrafakte -- i.e. input minimalisht të shqetësuar -- mund të ndihmojë përmirësimin e kësaj dobësie. Ne përqëndrohemi në detyrën e krijimit të kontrafakteve për përgjigjen e pyetjeve, e cila paraqet sfida unike lidhur me njohurinë botërore, diversitetin semantik dhe përgjigjësinë. Për të trajtuar këto sfida, ne zhvillojmë një teknikë Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) për të krijuar vlerësim kundërfaktor dhe trajnimin e të dhënave me mbikqyrje minimale njerëzore. Duke përdorur një kuadër QA të dominiu të hapur dhe modelin e gjenerimit të pyetjeve të trajnuar në të dhënat origjinale të detyrave, ne krijojmë kontrafakte që janë fluente, semantikisht të ndryshme dhe automatikisht të etiketuara. Data augmentation with RGF counterfactuals improves performance on out-of-domain and challenging evaluation sets over and above existing methods, in both the reading comprehension and open-domain QA settings.  Përveç kësaj, gjejmë se të dhënat RGF çojnë në përmirësime të rëndësishme në forcën e një modeli ndaj perturbacioneve lokale.', 'am': 'የNLP ዘዴዎች መግለጫ ለመግለጥ ጥቁር ናቸው፡፡ የአሁኑ ስራ የዳታ አካባቢ ተጨማሪ - ምናልባት በትንሹ የተጠቃሚ inputs - ይህንን ደካማ ማሳሳየት ይችላል፡፡ ለጥያቄ መልስ መፍጠርን እናቆማለን፤ ይህም የዓለም እውቀት፣ የsemantic ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት እና የመመልስ ጥያቄዎችን እናቀርባለን፡፡ እነዚህን ጥላቻዎች ለመቀበል፣ አዲስ-አዲስ አፍሪካ (RGF) ስልጣንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የክፈት ዶሜን የQA ፍሬማር እና የጥያቄ ትውልድ model በመጀመሪያ አድራሻ ዳታ የተጠቃሚ እና ፍላጎቶችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዳታ አቀማመጥ ከRGF ፊደል አድራጊዎችን ከዶሜን ውጪ እና የውጤት ማስታወቂያውን በሚያሳድግ እና በተገኘው ሥርዓት ላይ በማንበብ እና በክፈት ውይይት የQA ምርጫዎች በማንበብ እና በሚክፈት የዶሜን ምርጫዎች ላይ ያስቀምጣል። ደግሞም RGF ዳታ የሞዴል ልብስ ለባሕላዊ ግንኙነት የሚያሳድገውን እናገኛለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ խորը ՆԼՊ մոդելները թույլ են դարձնում անհանգստացման ներկայացման համար: Վերջին աշխատանքները ցույց են տալիս, որ տվյալների աճը հակափաստական գործիքներով, այսինքն՝ մինիմալ անհանգստացված ներմուծներով, կարող է օգնել բարելավել այս թույլությունը: Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք հարցերին պատասխանելու հակափաստեր ստեղծելու խնդրի վրա, որը առաջացնում է աշխարհի գիտելիքների, սեմանտիկ բազմազանության և պատասխանատվության յուրահատուկ մարտահրավեր: Այս մարտահրավերներին լուծելու համար մենք զարգանում ենք վերադարձ-ստեղծել-ֆիլտրել-ֆիլտրել(RFM) տեխնիկան, որպեսզի ստեղծենք հակափակցիոն գնահատման և ուսուցման տվյալներ մարդկային վերահսկողության մեջ: Using an open-domain QA framework and question generation model trained on original task data, we create counterfactuals that are fluent, semantically diverse, and automatically labeled.  Տվյալների աճը RFM հակափաստերի միջոցով բարելավում է արտադրողականությունը արտադրողականությամբ արտադրողականությամբ և դժվար գնահատման համակարգերից դուրս գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդներից դուրս և դուրս, ինչպես նաև կարդալու ընկալում, ինչպես Ավելին, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ RFM տվյալները հանգեցնում են նշանակալի բարելավումների մոդելի կայունության դեպի տեղական խեղճումներ:', 'az': 'Derin NLP modelləri giriş perturbasyonuna çox geniş göstərildi. Son i şdə verilən məlumat yüklənməsi haqsızlıqları ilə istifadə edir --- i.e. ən az müxtəlif inputlər --- bu zəifliyi dəyişdirə bilər. Biz sual cavab vermək üçün iftira-fəsad yaratmaq məqsədilə odaqlanırıq. Bu dünya elmi, semantik müxtəlif və cavabdeşliyi ilə müxtəlif izah edir. Bu çətinliklərdən çəkinmək üçün, az insan gözətçiliyi ilə haqsızlıq değerlendirməsi və təhsil məlumatlarını yaratmaq üçün Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) teknikini təhsil edirik. Açıq-domani QA framework ü və sual ürəkləri modelini təhsil edilən təhsil verilməsi ilə istifadə edirik. Biz hərəkətli, semantik müxtəlif və avtomatik etiketləndirilənlər yaradırıq. RGF haqsızlıqlıqları ilə verilən məlumat yüklənməsi domain dışında performansını yaxşılaşdırır və çətin değerlendirmə qurğuları, həmçin in oxuyan və açıq domain QA ayarlarında daha üstün və daha üstündə. Daha sonra, RGF verilənlərin model in in qüvvəti yerli perturbasyonlara möhkəm düzəltməs in ə yol göstərir.', 'af': "Deep NLP models is vertoon na wees brittle na invoer perturbasies. Onlangse werk het vertoon dat data augmentasie gebruik teenwoordigheid --- i.e. minimaal perturbeerde inputs --- kan help om hierdie swakheid te verander. Ons fokus op die opdrag van die skep van ongelukkiges vir vraag antwoord, wat unieke uitdagings aanbied met wêreld kennis, semantiese verskeidigheid en antwoordelikheid. Om hierdie uitdagings te adres, ontwikkel ons 'n Herhaal-Genereer-Filter(RGF) tekniks om teen-feilike evaluering en onderwerp data te skep met minimale menslike onderwerp. Gebruik van 'n oop-domein QA raamwerk en vraaggeneeringsmodel wat op oorspronklike taak data opgelei is, skep ons teen gevalle wat fluent is, semantiese verskeie en automaties etiketeerd. Data vergroot met RGF-geweldiges verbeter prestasie op buite-domein en uitgelaai evaluering stel oor en bo bestaande metodes, in beide die lees verstaan en open-domein QA instellings. Maar ons vind dat RGF-data lei na betekende verbeteringe in 'n model se kragtigheid na plaaslike perturbasies.", 'bn': 'গভীর NLP মডেল ইনপুটের বিপর্যয়ের জন্য ব্রিটাল দেখানো হয়েছে। সম্প্রতি কাজ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে যে বিরোধীদের ব্যবহার করে তথ্য যোগাযোগ করা হচ্ছে - যেমন নিম্নলিখিত ইনপুট- এই দুর্বলতাকে সাহায্য করবে। প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য আমরা বিরোধীদের বিরুদ্ধে মনোযোগ প্রদান করি, যা বিশ্ব জ্ঞান, সেমেন্টিক বৈচিত্র্য, এবং উত্তরের সাথে সম্পর্ক এই চ্যালেঞ্জের সাথে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি পুনরুদ্ধার-জেনারেট ফিল্টার (আরজিএফ) প্রযুক্তি উন্নয়ন করি যাতে মানুষের নিম্নিম্ন পর্যবে মূল কাজের তথ্যে প্রশিক্ষিত একটি খোলা ডোমেইন কিউএ ফ্রেম্পারেক্কার এবং প্রশ্নের প্রজন্ম মডেল ব্যবহার করে আমরা প্রতিযোগিতার সৃষ্টি করি, যারা  RGF-এর প্রতিপক্ষের সাথে ডাটা যোগাযোগ সংক্রান্ত তথ্য যোগ করা হচ্ছে ডোমেইন বাইরে পাওয়া যাবে এবং বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতিতে বিভিন্ন এবং বিদ্যমান মূল্যের মূল্ এছাড়াও আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে RGF তথ্য স্থানীয় বিপর্যয়ের কারণে একটি মডেলের পোশাকের কারণে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতির কারণ', 'bs': 'Pokazali su da su duboki NLP modeli veliki za ulazak perturbacija. Skorašnji rad pokazao je da povećanje podataka koristeći krivotvorne stvari --- t.i. minimalno uznemirene ulaznice --- može pomoći da poboljšava ovu slabost. Fokusiramo se na zadatak stvaranja krivotvornih reakcija na odgovor na pitanje, koji predstavlja jedinstvene izazove povezane sa svjetskim znanjem, semantičkom raznolikošću i odgovornošću. Da bi se riješili ovim izazovima, razvijemo tehniku proizvedenog filtra (RGF) za stvaranje krivotvorene procjene i obuku podataka sa minimalnim ljudskim nadzorom. Koristeći okvir otvorenog domena QA i model generacije pitanja obučen na originalnim podacima zadataka, stvorimo vile faktore koje su tekuće, semantički različite i automatski označene. Povećavanje podataka s pogrešnim ličnicima RGF-a poboljšava učinkovitost na izvan domena i izazovnim setima procjene iznad i iznad postojećih metoda, i u razumijevanju čitanja i postavljanju QA-a otvorenog domena. Osim toga, mi smatramo da podaci RGF vode do značajnih poboljšanja u robustnosti model a do lokalnih perturbacija.', 'cs': 'Bylo prokázáno, že hluboké NLP modely jsou křehké na vstupní poruchy. Nedávná práce ukázala, že rozšíření dat pomocí kontrafaktních látek --- tj. minimálně narušených vstupů --- může pomoci tuto slabost zmírnit. Zaměřujeme se na úkol vytváření kontrafaktů pro odpověď na otázky, které představují unikátní výzvy spojené se světovými znalostmi, sémantickou rozmanitostí a zodpovědností. Pro řešení těchto výzev vyvíjíme techniku Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF), která vytváří kontrafactická hodnocení a tréninková data s minimálním lidským dohledem. Pomocí otevřeného frameworku QA a modelu generování otázek trénovaného na původních datech úkolů vytváříme kontrafakty, které jsou plynulé, sémanticky rozmanité a automaticky označené. Rozšíření dat pomocí kontrafaktuálních prostředků RGF zlepšuje výkon mimo doménu a náročných hodnotících sad nad stávající metody, a to jak v porozumění čtení, tak v nastavení otevřené domény QA. Kromě toho zjišťujeme, že RGF data vedou k výraznému zlepšení robustnosti modelu vůči lokálním poruchám.', 'et': 'Sügav NLP mudelid on näidatud olevat sisendhäirete suhtes haprad. Hiljutised tööd on näidanud, et andmete suurendamine vastufaktuaalsete andmete abil , st minimaalselt häiritud sisendite abil , võib aidata seda nõrkust leevendada. Keskendume ülesandele luua vastufaktuaalseid küsimustele vastamiseks, mis pakuvad unikaalseid väljakutseid seoses maailma teadmiste, semantilise mitmekesisuse ja vastutavusega. Nende väljakutsete lahendamiseks töötame välja tagasivõtmise-genereerimise-filtri (RGF) tehnika, et luua vastupidiseid hindamis- ja koolitusandmeid minimaalse inimjärelevalvega. Avatud domeeni kvaliteedi tagamise raamistiku ja originaalsete ülesannete andmetel koolitatud küsimuste genereerimise mudeli abil loome vastufaktuaalseid, mis on sujuvad, semantiliselt mitmekesised ja automaatselt märgistatud. Andmete suurendamine RGF vastufaktuaalidega parandab tulemuslikkust domeenivälisetel ja keerulistel hindamiskomplektidel lisaks olemasolevatele meetoditele nii lugemise arusaamise kui ka avatud domeeni kvaliteedi tagamise seadetes. Lisaks leiame, et RGF andmed toovad kaasa märkimisväärse paranduse mudeli vastupidavuses kohalike häirete suhtes.', 'ca': "S'ha demostrat que els models profunds de NLP són fracassos per entrar perturbacions. La feina recent ha demostrat que el augment de les dades utilitzant contrafets -- és a dir, entrades mínimament perturbades -- pot ajudar a millorar aquesta debilitat. Ens centrem en la tasca de crear contrafets per respondre a preguntes, que presenten reptes únics relacionats amb el coneixement mundial, la diversitat semàntica i la resposabilitat. Per abordar aquests reptes, desenvolupem una tècnica Retrieve-Generate-Filter(RGF) per crear dades d'evaluació i entrenament contrafets amb una supervisió human a mínima. Utilitzant un marc QA de domini obert i un model de generació de preguntes entrenat en dades de tasca originals, creem contrafets que són fluents, semànticament diversificats i etiquetats automàticament. L'augment de les dades amb els contrafets del RGF millora el rendiment en conjunts d'evaluacions fora de domini i reptes més enllà dels mètodes existents, tant en la comprensió de lectura com en la QA de domini obert. A més, trobem que les dades del RGF porten a millores significatives en la robustet d'un model a les perturbacions locals.", 'fi': 'Deep NLP -mallien on osoitettu olevan hauraita syöttöhäiriöille. Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että datan lisääminen käyttämällä vastafaktoja -- eli minimaalisesti häiriintyneitä syötteitä -- voi auttaa lievittämään tätä heikkoutta. Keskitymme tehtävään luoda vastafaktoja kysymyksiin vastaamiselle, joka tuo esiin ainutlaatuisia haasteita liittyen maailman tietoon, semanttiseen monimuotoisuuteen ja vastattavuuteen. Näiden haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi kehitämme Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) -tekniikan, jonka avulla voimme luoda vastakohtaisia arviointi- ja koulutustietoja minimaalisella ihmisvalvonnalla. Käyttämällä avoimen verkkotunnuksen laadunvarmistuskehystä ja alkuperäisiin tehtävätietoihin koulutettua kysymysteknologiamallia luomme vastafaktoja, jotka ovat sujuvasti, semanttisesti monipuolisia ja automaattisesti merkittyjä. Tietojen lisääminen RGF-vastafaktoilla parantaa suorituskykyä toimialueen ulkopuolisissa ja haastavissa arviointisarjoissa nykyisten menetelmien lisäksi sekä lukemisen ymmärtämisen että avoimen toimialueen laadunvarmistuksen asetuksissa. Lisäksi havaitsemme, että RGF-tiedot parantavat merkittävästi mallin kestävyyttä paikallisille häiriöille.', 'he': 'מודלים עמוקים של NLP הוכחו להיות חלשים להכניס הפרעות. העבודה האחרונה הראה שגידול נתונים בשימוש חומרים נגד עובדות -- כלומר כניסות מופרעות מינימלית -- יכול לעזור לשפר את החולשה הזאת. אנו מתמקדים במשימה ליצור חומרים נגד עובדות לענות על שאלות, שמציג אתגרים מיוחדים שקשורים לידע העולם, מגוון סמנטי, וביכולת לענות. כדי להתמודד עם האתגרים האלה, אנו מפתחים טכניקה של צינור-השיג (Retrieve-Generate-Filter - RGF) כדי ליצור עריכה נגד עובדות ומידע אימון עם פיקוח אנושי מינימלי. בשימוש במסגרת QA בתחום פתוח ומודל דוור שאלות מאומן על נתוני משימה מקורי, אנחנו יוצרים חומרים נגד עובדות ששונים, מגוונים סמנטית, ומתווים אוטומטית. גידול נתונים עם RGF משפר ביצועים מחוץ לתחום והעריכה מאתגרת קבוצות מעל ושיטות קיימות, גם בהבנת הקריאה וגם בהגדרות QA בתחום פתוח. בנוסף, אנו מוצאים שמידע RGF מוביל לשיפורים משמעותיים בחזקה של מודל לפרעות מקומיות.', 'ha': 'An nuna motsalan NLP guda da za\'a yi murura ga mai shiga turbatori. Yin aikin da aka sani ya nuna cewa, ƙarayen data na yi amfani da shiryoyin abubuwa - misali, da ƙarami masu buƙata -za\'a iya ƙara wannan rauni. Tuna jiyya da aikin ka sami bakwai masu tambaya, wanda ke gauraya wa\'adin musamman da ilmi, da bakwai da jibar. To, in bayyana wa waɗannan tsummõmi, muna buɗe wata tudunar "Fitarwa-Mai Make-Fitarwa"(RGF) don a sami mutane na ƙididdigewa da tsari masu ƙaranci. @ info: whatsthis Ƙara data da fuskokin RGF na ƙara mafarin aikin bayani na ci-Domen kuma yana daidaita ƙidãya masu ƙidãya na zaman da baka, cikin tsarin karatun tsarin QA da ake buɗewa. Kayya, za\'a gane cewa data na RGF za\'a iya ƙara mafiya kyau a cikin wata misalin misalin na mutane.', 'sk': 'Pokazano je, da so modeli globokega NLP krhki za vhodne motnje. Nedavno delo je pokazalo, da lahko povečanje podatkov z uporabo nasprotnih dejstev -- tj. minimalno motenih vnosov -- pomaga izboljšati to šibkost. Osredotočamo se na nalogo ustvarjanja kontrafaktov za odgovor na vprašanja, ki predstavljajo edinstvene izzive, povezane s svetovnim znanjem, semantično raznolikostjo in odgovornostjo. Za reševanje teh izzivov razvijamo tehniko Retrieve-Generate-Filter (RGF) za ustvarjanje kontractualnih podatkov o ocenjevanju in usposabljanju z minimalnim človeškim nadzorom. S pomočjo odprtega domenskega okvira za zagotavljanje kakovosti in modela ustvarjanja vprašanj, usposobljenega na podlagi izvirnih podatkov o opravilih, ustvarjamo kontrafaktuale, ki so tekoče, semantično raznolike in samodejno označene. Povečanje podatkov z RGF kontrafaktuali izboljšuje učinkovitost pri zunajdomenskih in zahtevnih vrstah vrednotenja poleg obstoječih metod, tako pri razumevanju branja kot pri nastavitvah odprtega domenskega zagotavljanja kakovosti. Poleg tega ugotavljamo, da RGF podatki vodijo do znatnih izboljšav robustnosti modela za lokalne motnje.', 'bo': 'Deep NLP models have been shown to be brittle to input perturbations. Recently work has shown that data augmentation using counterfactuals --- i.e. minimally perturbed inputs --- can help ameliorate this weakness. ང་ཚོས་རེ་བ་ལན་གསལ་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བློ་གཏོང་མི་འདུག་གམ། གདོང་ལེན་འདི་དག་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ལྟར་པར་ང་ཚོས་སྐྱེས་རྗེས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་ཡིན། Using an open-domain QA framework and question generation model trained on original task data, we create counterfactuals that are fluent, semantically diverse, and automatically labeled. Data augmentation with RGF counterfactuals improves performance on out-of-domain and challenging evaluation sets over and above existing methods, in both the reading comprehension and open-domain QA settings. ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་RGF་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཚད་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་གཏོང་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'deep NLP model have been displayed to be bright to input pertruations. text-editor-action Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe barang kanggo nggawe luwih-luwih kanggo ngilanggar cebrol, sing nyimpen kuwi kesempatan sing nggawe awak dhéwé, sematik lan kedaulakno kanggo nganggo perbudhakan iki, kita ngulinakake tékno retripe-Generate-File(RFF) kanggo nggawe barang nggawe barang sistem kuwi nggawe barang sistem kuwi nggawe barang maning kuwi nggawe nguasar apel dumadhi. Using an open data agement with NGF count rpectual advances success on out-of Mungkin, awak dhéwé luwih-luwih kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo mbelangno model sing gak nggawe gerakan kanggo tukang.'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Hierarchy into Text Encoder a Contrastive Learning Approach for Hierarchical Text Classification', 'ar': 'DYLE: استخراج كامن ديناميكي لتلخيص المدخلات الطويلة التلخيصية', 'fr': 'DYLE\xa0: Extraction latente dynamique pour la synthèse abstraite des entrées longues', 'es': 'DYLE: Extracción latente dinámica para sumarización abstractiva de entradas largas', 'pt': 'DYLE: extração latente dinâmica para sumarização abstrativa de entrada longa', 'ja': 'DYLE ：抽象的な長入力要約のための動的潜在抽出', 'zh': 'DYLE:抽象长输汇,潜于萃取', 'hi': 'DYLE: Abstractive Long-Input Summarization के लिए डायनेमिक अव्यक्त निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'DYLE: Dynamic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summarization (Динамическая скрытая экстракция для абстрактного длинновходного суммирования)', 'ga': 'DYLE: Eastóscadh Folaigh Dinimiciúla le haghaidh Achoimriú Fad-Ionchuir Teibí', 'el': 'Δυναμική λανθάνουσα εξαγωγή για την αφηρημένη σύνοψη μακράς εισόδου', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'DYLE: Dinamikus Latent Extraction absztrakt hosszú bemeneti összefoglaláshoz', 'kk': 'DYLE: Абстрактивті ұзын келтіру тұжырымдамасының динамикалық кейінгі тарқатуы', 'it': 'DYLE: Estrazione Latente Dinamica per Sintesi Astrattiva a Lungo Input', 'lt': 'DYLE: Dinaminė vėluojanti ekstrakcija abstrakčiai ilgo įvedimo santraukai', 'mk': 'DYLE: Dynamic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summarization', 'ms': 'DYLE: Ekstraksi Kemudian Dinamik untuk Ringkasan Input Panjang Abstraktif', 'ml': 'DYLE: അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ നീള- ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ചുരുക്കം', 'mt': 'DYLE: Estrazzjoni Dinamika Latenti għal Sommarju Abstrattiv ta’ Input Tul', 'mn': 'ДYLE: Абстрактив урт оргилуудын хувьд хөгжлийн дараагийн нэмэлт', 'pl': 'DYLE: Dynamiczna ekstrakcja latentna dla abstrakcyjnego podsumowania długiego wejścia', 'no': 'DYLE: Dynamisk latent utpakking for abstraktiv langinndatasamandrag', 'ro': 'DYLE: Extracție laterală dinamică pentru rezumarea abstractivă cu intrare lungă', 'sr': 'DYLE: Dinamička kasna ekstrakcija za abstraktivnu dugačku rezervaciju ulaza', 'si': 'DYLE: නිර්මාණික ලොකු ඇතුළුම් සාර්ථකය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තර කරන්න', 'sv': 'DYLE: Dynamisk Latent Extraction för abstraktiv summering med lång ingång', 'so': 'DYLE: Dynamic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summarization', 'ta': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'ur': 'DYLE: Abstractive Long-Input Summarization for Dynamic Latent Extraction', 'uz': 'DYLE: Abstractiv uzun- kiritish uchun kattalashtirish', 'vi': 'DPhim: khí Ngoại khí cho kết cấu dài nội dung', 'nl': 'DYLE: Dynamische latente extractie voor abstracte samenvatting van lange invoer', 'da': 'DYLE: Dynamisk Latent Extraction for Abstraktiv Lang Input Summarisation', 'bg': 'Динамично латентно извличане за абстрактивно обобщаване на дългия вход', 'hr': 'DYLE: Dinamička kasna izvlačenja za abstraktivnu sažetku dugog ulaza', 'ko': 'DYLE: 추상적인 긴 입력 요약의 동적 잠재적 추출', 'de': 'DYLE: Dynamische latente Extraktion für abstraktive Long-Input Summarisation', 'id': 'Dynamic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summarization', 'sw': 'DYLE: Kutengenezwa kwa muda mrefu kwa ajili ya kujitoa ndogo', 'fa': 'DYLE: اخراج دینامیک تاخیر برای جمع\u200cآوری طولانی\u200cوارد abstractive', 'tr': 'family', 'af': 'DYLE: Dinamiese Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long- Input Summarization', 'sq': 'Dynamic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summarization', 'am': 'dynamic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summary', 'hy': 'DYLE: Դինամիկ ուշացած արտադրումը վերացական երկար ներմուծի համառոտագրման համար', 'az': 'DYLE: Abstraktiv Uzun Girdi Toplaşımı üçün dinamik Sonrakı Çıqış', 'bn': 'DYLE: আবত্ত্রিক লম্বা- ইনপুট সামারিজেশনের জন্য ডাইনামিক ল্যাট এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'bs': 'DYLE: Dinamička kasna izvlačenja za abstraktivnu sažetku dugog ulaza', 'cs': 'DYLE: Dynamická latentní extrakce pro abstrakční shrnutí dlouhého vstupu', 'ca': 'DYLE: Dinàmic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summary', 'et': 'DYLE: dünaamiline latent ekstraheerimine pika sisendi kokkuvõtmiseks', 'fi': 'DYLE: Dynamic Latent Extraction for Abstractive Long-Input Summarization', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'DYLE: Dinamično latentno ekstrakcijo za abstraktivno povzetek dolgega vnosa', 'ha': 'DYLE: dictionary variant', 'he': 'QXml', 'bo': 'DYLE: Abstractive Long-Input Summarization'}
{'en': 'Hierarchical text classification is a challenging subtask of multi label classification due to its complex label hierarchy Existing methods encode text and label hierarchy separately and mix their representations for classification where the hierarchy remains unchanged for all input text Instead of modeling them separately in this work we propose Hierarchy guided Contrastive Learning HGCLR to directly embed the hierarchy into a text encoder During training HGCLR constructs positive samples for input text under the guidance of the label hierarchy By pulling together the input text and its positive sample the text encoder can learn to generate the hierarchy aware text representation independently Therefore after training the HGCLR enhanced text encoder can dispense with the redundant hierarchy Extensive experiments on three benchmark datasets verify the effectiveness of HGCLR', 'ar': 'حققت النماذج القائمة على المحولات أداءً متطورًا في تلخيص المدخلات القصيرة. ومع ذلك ، ما زالوا يعانون من تلخيص نص أطول. في هذا البحث ، نقدم DYLE ، وهو أسلوب استخلاص كامن ديناميكي جديد للتلخيص التجريدي طويل المدخلات. يقوم DYLE بشكل مشترك بتدريب المستخرج والمولد ويعامل مقتطفات النص المستخرجة على أنها المتغير الكامن ، مما يسمح بأوزان الانتباه الديناميكية على مستوى المقتطف أثناء فك التشفير. لتوفير الإشراف الكافي ، نقترح طرقًا بسيطة لكنها فعالة لاستخراج أوراكل بالإضافة إلى مصطلح فقدان الاتساق ، والذي يشجع المستخرج على تقريب متوسط الأوزان الديناميكية التي تنبأ بها المولد. نقوم بتقييم طريقتنا في مهام تلخيص مختلفة للوثيقة الطويلة والحوار الطويل: GovReport و QMSum و arXiv. تظهر نتائج التجربة أن DYLE يتفوق في الأداء على جميع الطرق الموجودة في GovReport و QMSum ، مع مكاسب تصل إلى 6.1 ROUGE ، بينما تسفر عن نتائج قوية على arXiv. يوضح التحليل الإضافي أن الأوزان الديناميكية المقترحة توفر إمكانية تفسير عملية التوليد لدينا.', 'fr': "Les modèles basés sur des transformateurs ont atteint des performances de pointe en matière de synthèse des entrées courtes. Cependant, ils ont encore du mal à résumer un texte plus long. Dans cet article, nous présentons DYLE, une nouvelle approche d'extraction latente dynamique pour la synthèse abstraite d'entrées longues. DYLE entraîne conjointement un extracteur et un générateur et traite les extraits de texte extraits comme la variable latente, ce qui permet des pondérations d'attention dynamiques au niveau de l'extrait pendant le décodage. Pour fournir une supervision adéquate, nous proposons des heuristiques simples mais efficaces pour l'extraction d'oracle ainsi qu'un terme de perte de cohérence, qui encourage l'extracteur à approximer les poids dynamiques moyens prédits par le générateur. Nous évaluons notre méthode sur différentes tâches de synthèse de longs documents et de longs dialogues\xa0: GovReport, QMSum et arXiv. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent que DYLE surpasse toutes les méthodes existantes sur GovReport et QMSum, avec des gains allant jusqu'à 6,1 ROUGE, tout en donnant de bons résultats sur arXiv. Une analyse plus approfondie montre que les pondérations dynamiques proposées offrent une interprétabilité de notre processus de génération.", 'es': 'Los modelos basados en transformadores han logrado un rendimiento de vanguardia en la sumarización de entradas cortas. Sin embargo, todavía les cuesta resumir textos más largos. En este artículo, presentamos DYLE, un novedoso enfoque de extracción latente dinámica para la sumarización abstractiva de entradas largas. DYLE entrena conjuntamente un extractor y un generador y trata los fragmentos de texto extraídos como la variable latente, lo que permite ponderaciones de atención dinámicas a nivel de fragmento durante la decodificación. Para proporcionar una supervisión adecuada, proponemos una heurística simple pero efectiva para la extracción de oráculos, así como un término de pérdida de consistencia, que alienta al extractor a aproximarse a los pesos dinámicos promedio pronosticados por el generador. Evaluamos nuestro método en diferentes tareas de resumen de documentos largos y diálogos largos: GovReport, QMSum y ArXiv. Los resultados del experimento muestran que DYLE supera a todos los métodos existentes en GovReport y QMSum, con ganancias de hasta 6.1 ROUGE, al tiempo que arroja sólidos resultados en ArXiv. Un análisis más detallado muestra que las ponderaciones dinámicas propuestas proporcionan interpretabilidad de nuestro proceso de generación.', 'pt': 'Os modelos baseados em transformador alcançaram desempenho de última geração na sumarização de entrada curta. No entanto, eles ainda lutam para resumir textos mais longos. Neste artigo, apresentamos DYLE, uma nova abordagem de extração latente dinâmica para sumarização abstrativa de entrada longa. O DYLE treina em conjunto um extrator e um gerador e trata os trechos de texto extraídos como a variável latente, permitindo pesos dinâmicos de atenção no nível do trecho durante a decodificação. Para fornecer supervisão adequada, propomos heurísticas simples, porém eficazes, para extração de oráculos, bem como um termo de perda de consistência, que incentiva o extrator a aproximar os pesos dinâmicos médios previstos pelo gerador. Avaliamos nosso método em diferentes tarefas de resumo de documentos longos e diálogos longos: GovReport, QMSum e arXiv. Os resultados do experimento mostram que o DYLE supera todos os métodos existentes no GovReport e QMSum, com ganhos de até 6,1 ROUGE, enquanto produz resultados fortes no arXiv. Uma análise mais aprofundada mostra que os pesos dinâmicos propostos fornecem interpretabilidade do nosso processo de geração.', 'ja': '変圧器ベースのモデルは、ショート入力の要約で最先端の性能を達成しています。 しかしながら、彼らはやはりより長いテキストをまとめることに苦労している。 本稿では、抽象的な長入力要約のための新規の動的潜伏抽出アプローチであるDyleを紹介する。 DYLEはエキストラクターとジェネレーターを共同トレーニングし、抽出されたテキストスニペットを潜伏変数として扱うことで、デコード中の動的スニペットレベルの注意重みを可能にします。 適切な監督を提供するために、私たちはオラクル抽出のための単純で効果的なヒューリスティックと、抽出者がジェネレータによって予測される平均動的重みを近似することを奨励する一貫性損失項を提案します。 Googleでは、GovReport、QMSum、arXivなど、さまざまな長い文書と長いダイアログの要約タスクに関するメソッドを評価しています。 実験結果は、DyleがGovReportとQMSumの既存のすべての方法を上回り、最大6.1ルージュの利得をもたらす一方で、arXivで強力な結果をもたらすことを示しています。 さらなる分析は、提案された動的重みが私たちの生成プロセスの解釈可能性を提供することを示しています。', 'zh': '盖变压器形于短输汇总,先进之性也。 然犹力结文本。 本文中,我们发出DYLE,一种用抽象长输入汇总的新型动态潜在提取法。 DYLE合训提取器生成器,以提取之本片段视为潜变量,而许动于解码片段级之重。 为足以监督,为言机取简效之启发式,及一致性损项,此劝提取器近生成器之均动权也。 异长文档与长对摘要事,GovReport,QMSumarXiv。 实验结果表明,DYLE优于GovReportQMSum,增益高6.1 ROUGE,而劲于arXiv。 益分析表明,权重为我生事可解释性。', 'hi': 'ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित मॉडल ने शॉर्ट-इनपुट सारांशीकरण पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन हासिल किया है। हालांकि, वे अभी भी लंबे समय तक पाठ को सारांशित करने के साथ संघर्ष करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम DYLE, अमूर्त लंबे समय तक इनपुट सारांशीकरण के लिए एक उपन्यास गतिशील अव्यक्त निष्कर्षण दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। DYLE संयुक्त रूप से एक चिमटा और एक जनरेटर को प्रशिक्षित करता है और निकाले गए पाठ स्निपेट को अव्यक्त चर के रूप में मानता है, जिससे डिकोडिंग के दौरान गतिशील स्निपेट-स्तर के ध्यान वजन की अनुमति मिलती है। पर्याप्त पर्यवेक्षण प्रदान करने के लिए, हम ओरेकल निष्कर्षण के साथ-साथ एक स्थिरता हानि शब्द के लिए सरल अभी तक प्रभावी ह्यूरिस्टिक्स का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक्सट्रैक्टर को जनरेटर द्वारा अनुमानित औसत गतिशील वजन का अनुमान लगाने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करता है। हम विभिन्न लंबे-दस्तावेज़ और लंबे समय तक संवाद सारांशीकरण कार्यों पर हमारी विधि का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: GovReport, QMSum, और arXiv। प्रयोग के परिणामों से पता चलता है कि DYLE GovReport और QMSum पर सभी मौजूदा तरीकों से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है, जिसमें 6.1 रूज तक का लाभ होता है, जबकि arXiv पर मजबूत परिणाम प्राप्त होते हैं। आगे के विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित गतिशील वजन हमारी पीढ़ी की प्रक्रिया की व्याख्या प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Модели, основанные на трансформаторах, достигли самых современных показателей при суммировании с коротким входом. Тем не менее, они все еще пытаются резюмировать более длинный текст. В этой статье мы представляем Dyle, новый динамический подход к латентной экстракции для абстрактного обобщения длинного ввода. DYLE совместно обучает извлекатель и генератор и рассматривает извлеченные фрагменты текста как скрытую переменную, позволяя динамически взвешивать внимание на уровне фрагментов во время декодирования. Чтобы обеспечить адекватный надзор, мы предлагаем простую, но эффективную эвристику для экстракции оракула, а также термин потери согласованности, который побуждает экстрактор приближаться к усредненным динамическим весам, предсказанным генератором. Мы оцениваем наш метод на различных задачах обобщения длинных документов и длинных диалогов: GovReport, QMSum, arXiv. Результаты эксперимента показывают, что DYLE превосходит все существующие методы на GovReport и QMSum, с выигрышем до 6,1 ROUGE, в то же время давая сильные результаты на arXiv. Дальнейший анализ показывает, что предлагаемые динамические веса обеспечивают интерпретируемость нашего процесса генерации.', 'ga': 'Tá feidhmíocht úrscothach bainte amach ag samhlacha atá bunaithe ar chlaochladán maidir le hachoimriú gearr-ionchuir. Mar sin féin, bíonn siad fós ag streachailt le hachoimriú a dhéanamh ar théacs níos faide. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid DYLE i láthair, cur chuige nua eastósctha folaigh dinimiciúil maidir le hachoimriú fad-ionchuir teibí. Comhthraenáileann DYLE eastóscóir agus gineadóir agus déileálann sé leis na sleachta téacs a bhaintear mar an athróg fholaigh, rud a ligeann do mheáchain airde dinimiciúil ar leibhéal na blúire le linn díchódaithe. Chun maoirseacht leordhóthanach a sholáthar, molaimid heuristics simplí fós éifeachtach maidir le heastóscadh oracle chomh maith le téarma caillteanas comhsheasmhachta, rud a spreagann an t-eastóscadh an meánmheáchan dinimiciúla atá tuartha ag an gineadóir a chomhfhogasú. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár modh ar thascanna éagsúla achomair doiciméad fada agus fad-idirphlé: GovReport, QMSum, agus arXiv. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh go sáraíonn DYLE na modhanna ar fad atá ann cheana féin ar GovReport agus QMSum, le gnóthachain suas go 6.1 ROUGE, agus torthaí láidre á dtáirgeadh ar arXiv. Léiríonn anailís bhreise go soláthraíonn na meáchain dhinimiciúla atá beartaithe inléirmhíniú ár bpróiseas giniúna.', 'hu': 'A transzformátor alapú modellek a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt érték el rövid bemeneti összefoglalással. Azonban még mindig küzdenek a hosszabb szövegek összefoglalásával. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a DYLE-t, egy új dinamikus látens extrakciós megközelítést az absztraktív hosszú bemeneti összefoglaláshoz. A DYLE együttesen kiképez egy extraktort és egy generátort, és a kivont szövegrészleteket látens változóként kezeli, lehetővé téve a dekódolás során dinamikus részletszintű figyelemsúlyokat. A megfelelő felügyelet biztosítása érdekében egyszerű, mégis hatékony heurisztikát javasolunk az orákulus extrakcióhoz, valamint egy konzisztencia veszteség kifejezést, amely arra ösztönzi az extrakciót, hogy közelítse meg a generátor által előrejelzett átlagos dinamikai súlyokat. Módszerünket különböző hosszú dokumentumos és hosszú párbeszédű összefoglaló feladatokban értékeljük: GovReport, QMSum és arXiv. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a DYLE felülmúlja az összes meglévő módszert a GovReport és a QMSum-n, 6,1 ROUGE növekedéssel, miközben erős eredményeket hoz az arXiv-on. További elemzések azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt dinamikus súlyok biztosítják generálási folyamatunk értelmezhetőségét.', 'ka': 'Name მაგრამ, ისინი უკვე უფრო მეტი ტექსტის შესაბამისათვის მუშაობენ. ჩვენ DYLE-ს პრომენტიკური დინამიკური ლატენტი ექსტრექციის მიზეზი აბსტრაქტიური დიდი გესტრექციის კომუნიზაციისთვის გამოყენებთ. Name ჩვენ უნდა დავამუშავოთ მარტივი დანარწმუნებელი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური ჰესურისტიკის გამოყენებაში, რომელიც განსხვავებელი ტემისთვის, რომელიც ექსტრაკტორის მოთხოვრება, რომ გენერატორის განსაზღვრებული ჩვენ განსხვავებული დოკუმენტის განსხვავებული სიგრძე დოკუმენტის და დიალოგის განსხვავებული დავალებების შესახებ: GovReport, QMSum და arXiv. ექსპერიმენტის შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ DYLE გავაკეთება ყველა მსგავსი პროცემების GovReport და QMSum-ზე, რომელიც 6. 1 ROUGE-ზე გავაკეთება, როცა arXiv-ზე ძალიან შედეგი შედეგია. დამატებული ანალიზია, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენის დინამიკური განზომილებები განსხვავებელობა ჩვენი წარმოდგენის პროცესის.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα με βάση τον μετασχηματιστή έχουν επιτύχει την τελευταία απόδοση στην σύνοψη εισόδου. Ωστόσο, εξακολουθούν να δυσκολεύονται να συνοψίσουν μεγαλύτερο κείμενο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα δυναμική λανθάνουσα προσέγγιση εξαγωγής για αφηρημένη σύνοψη μεγάλης εισόδου. Το εκπαιδεύει από κοινού έναν εξαγωγέα και μια γεννήτρια και αντιμετωπίζει τα αποσπασμένα αποσπάσματα κειμένου ως λανθάνουσα μεταβλητή, επιτρέποντας δυναμικά βάρη προσοχής επιπέδου αποσπάσματος κατά την αποκωδικοποίηση. Για την επαρκή εποπτεία, προτείνουμε απλές αλλά αποτελεσματικές heuristics για την εξαγωγή μαντείων καθώς και έναν όρο απώλειας συνέπειας, ο οποίος ενθαρρύνει τον εξαγωγέα να προσεγγίσει τα μέσα δυναμικά βάρη που προβλέπει η γεννήτρια. Αξιολογούμε τη μέθοδο μας σε διαφορετικά καθήκοντα σύνοψης μακράς διάρκειας εγγράφων και μακράς διάρκειας διαλόγου: και arXiv. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι το DYLE ξεπερνά όλες τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους σε GovReport και QMSum, με κέρδη μέχρι 6.1 ROUGE, ενώ αποδίδει ισχυρά αποτελέσματα στο arXiv. Περαιτέρω ανάλυση δείχνει ότι τα προτεινόμενα δυναμικά βάρη παρέχουν δυνατότητα ερμηνείας της διαδικασίας παραγωγής μας.', 'it': "I modelli basati su trasformatori hanno raggiunto prestazioni all'avanguardia sulla sintesi a breve input. Tuttavia, hanno ancora difficoltà a riassumere il testo più lungo. In questo articolo presentiamo DYLE, un nuovo approccio dinamico di estrazione latente per la sintesi astratta a lungo input. DYLE addestra congiuntamente un estrattore e un generatore e tratta i frammenti di testo estratti come la variabile latente, consentendo pesi di attenzione dinamici a livello di snippet durante la decodifica. Per fornire una supervisione adeguata, proponiamo euristiche semplici ma efficaci per l'estrazione degli oracoli e un termine di perdita di consistenza, che incoraggia l'estrattore a approssimare i pesi dinamici medi previsti dal generatore. Valutiamo il nostro metodo su diversi compiti di sintesi a lungo termine e lungo dialogo: GovReport, QMSum e arXiv. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano che DYLE supera tutti i metodi esistenti su GovReport e QMSum, con guadagni fino a 6,1 ROUGE, mentre produce risultati forti su arXiv. Un'ulteriore analisi mostra che i pesi dinamici proposti forniscono un'interpretazione del nostro processo di generazione.", 'kk': 'Трансформацияны негіздеген үлгілер қысқа кіріс тұжырымдамасындағы күй- жайы жұмысын жетті. Бірақ олар әлі ұзақ мәтінді жазып тұрады. Бұл қағазда DYLE- ті, абстрактивті ұзын келтіру үшін романдық динамикалық латенттік тарқату тәсілі көрсетеді. DYLE біріктіріп шығарушы мен генераторын жасап, шығарылған мәтін скриптерін келесі айнымалыс ретінде қалады, декодтау кезінде динамикалық скриптер деңгейіндегі қатынастың теңдігін қолданады. Бұл жеткілікті қарау үшін, біз оракулық тарқату үшін қарапайым, бірақ эффективні геуристиканы және тұрақтық жоғалу термині жұмыс істейміз. Бұл экстракторды генератор жасаған орташа динамикалық теңдіктерді жақ Біз әдімізді басқа ұзын құжат және ұзын диалогтың жинақтау тапсырмаларында бағалаймыз: GovReport, QMSum және arXiv. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері DYLE GovReport және QMSum арқылы барлық әдістерді шектеп, arXiv арқылы күшті нәтижелерді алып тастағанда 6. 1 ROUGE дегенді көрсетеді. Қосымша анализ келтірілген динамикалық теглері жасау процесінің түсініктемесін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Трансформските модели постигнаа најсовремени резултати на краткото резултатирање. Сепак, тие сé уште се борат со сумирање на подолг текст. Во овој весник, претставуваме ДYLE, нов динамички лантен пристап на екстракција за апстрактивна долга резултатација. ДYLE заедно обучува екстрактор и генератор и ги третира екстрактираните текстови како latent variable, овозможувајќи динамични тегови на внимание на нивото на екстрактор за време на декодирање. За да обезбедиме соодветен надзор, предлагаме едноставни, но ефикасни хеористики за извлекување на ораклот, како и термин на загуба на константност, кој го охрабрува извлекувачот да ги приближи просечните динамични тегови предвидени од генераторот. Ние го проценуваме нашиот метод на различни долги документи и долги дијалози резултати: GovReport, QMSum и arXiv. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека ДYLE ги надминува сите постоечки методи на GovReport и QMSum, со добивки до 6,1 ROUGE, истовремено давајќи силни резултати на arXiv. Понатамошната анализа покажува дека предложените динамични тегови обезбедуваат интерпретабилност на процесот на нашата генерација.', 'lt': 'Perdirbėjais pagrįsti modeliai suteikė naujausius rezultatus trumpalaikio įvedimo santraukoje. However, they still struggle with summarizing longer text.  Šiame dokumente pristatome DYLE, naują dinamišką latentišką ekstrahavimo metodą abstraktyviai ilgo įvedimo santraukai. DYLE bendrai apmoko ekstraktorių ir generatorių ir traktuoja ekstrahuotus teksto gabalus kaip latentinį kintamąjį, leidžiantį dinamiškus gabalėlių lygio dėmesio svorius dekoduojant. Kad būtų užtikrinta tinkama priežiūra, siūlome paprastą, tačiau veiksmingą orakulio gavybos heuristiką ir nuoseklumo praradimo terminą, kuris skatina ekstraktorių suderinti generatoriaus numatytus vidutinius dinaminius svorius. Vertiname savo metodą įvairių ilgų dokumentų ir ilgų dialogų santraukų užduočių: GovReport, QMSum ir arXiv. Eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad DYLE viršija visus esamus GovReport ir QMSum metodus, o padidėjimas – iki 6,1 ROUGE, o arXiv rezultatai yra tvirti. Iš tolesnės analizės matyti, kad siūlomi dinaminiai svoriai suteikia galimybę suprasti mūsų gamybos procesą.', 'ms': 'Model berasaskan-pengubah telah mencapai prestasi-state-of-the-art pada ringkasan input pendek. Namun, mereka masih berjuang dengan menghitung teks yang lebih panjang. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan DYLE, pendekatan ekstraksi dinamik yang tersembunyi yang baru untuk ringkasan input panjang abstraktif. DYLE bersama-sama melatih pengekstraktor dan generator dan memperlakukan snippets teks ekstrak sebagai pembolehubah tersembunyi, membolehkan berat perhatian aras-snippet dinamik semasa penyahkodan. Untuk menyediakan pengawasan yang sesuai, kami cadangkan heuristik sederhana tetapi efektif untuk ekstraksi orakul serta term a kehilangan konsistensi, yang mendorong ekstraktor untuk mengharapkan berat dinamik rata-rata yang dijangka oleh generator. Kami menilai kaedah kami pada tugas ringkasan dokumen panjang dan dialog panjang berbeza: GovReport, QMSum, dan arXiv. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa DYLE melampaui semua kaedah yang ada pada GovReport dan QMSum, dengan keuntungan sehingga 6.1 ROUGE, sementara memberikan keputusan yang kuat pada arXiv. Analisis lanjut menunjukkan bahawa berat dinamik yang diusulkan memberikan pengenalan proses generasi kita.', 'ml': 'ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d ചുരുക്കി- ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ചുരുക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതില്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയു എന്നാലും, അവര്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴും കൂടുതല്\u200d പാഠങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പോരാടുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഡിയ്ലിയെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡൈനാമിക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കാനുള്ള പ്രാധാന്യം നീണ്ട നീണ്ട അകത DYLE ഒരു എക്രട്ടറും ജെനററേറ്റരും സഹജമായ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുകയും, പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് സ്നിപ്പിറ്റുകള്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള വേരിയല ആവശ്യമായ നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എളുപ്പത്തില്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമായ ഹൂരിസ്റ്റിസ്റ്റിക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സാധ്യതയുള്ള നഷ്ടമുള്ള വേളയും  നമ്മുടെ രീതിയെ വ്യത്യസ്ത രേഖയിലും നീണ്ട ഡയലോഗ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ജോലികളിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളിലും വിലയിച്ച് നാം വി പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഗോവ് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിലും ക്യൂഎസ്യൂമിലും നിലവിലുള്ള എല്ലാ രീതികളും ഡിയ്ല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക് കൂടുതല്\u200d അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച ഡൈനാമിക്ക് തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ തലമുറതലമുറതലമ', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli bbażati fuq it-trasformaturi kisbu prestazzjoni avvanzata fuq sommarju ta’ input qasir. Madankollu, xorta għadhom qed ibatu biex iqisu t-test itwal. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw DYLE, approċċ dinamiku ġdid ta’ estrazzjoni moħbija għal sommarju astrattiv ta’ input twil. DYLE iħarreġ b’mod konġunt estrattur u ġeneratur u jittratta l-qtugħ tat-test estratt bħala l-varjabbli moħbija, li jippermetti piżijiet dinamiċi ta’ attenzjoni fil-livell tat-qtugħ waqt id-dekodifikazzjoni. Biex nipprovdu superviżjoni adegwata, nipproponu ħewristiċi sempliċi iżda effettivi għall-estrazzjoni tal-oraklu kif ukoll terminu ta’ telf ta’ konsistenza, li jinkoraġġixxi lill-estrattur biex joqrob il-piżijiet dinamiċi medji mbassra mill-ġeneratur. Aħna jevalwaw il-metodu tagħna dwar kompiti ta’ sommarju ta’ dokumenti twal u ta’ djalogu twil differenti: GovReport, QMSum, u arXiv. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru li d-DYLE jaqbeż il-metodi eżistenti kollha dwar GovReport u QMSum, b’kisbiet sa 6.1 ROUGE, filwaqt li jagħti riżultati b’saħħithom fuq arXiv. Analiżi ulterjuri turi li l-piżijiet dinamiċi proposti jipprovdu interpretabbiltà tal-proċess ta’ ġenerazzjoni tagħna.', 'mn': 'Төгсгөлдөгч-суурилсан загварууд богино орлуулалтын хуваалтын үндсэн үйл ажиллагааг гаргасан. Гэвч тэд урт хугацааны текст цуглуулахад тулалдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ДYLE-г шинэ динамикийн соронзон хайлтын арга замыг харуулж байна. DYLE хамтдаа хамтрагч болон генератор дамжуулж, хадгалагдсан текстүүдийг хамтрагч хувьсагч гэж үздэг. Динамик хэмжээний анхаарал татах хэмжээсүүдийг шилжүүлэх үед хөдөлгөөн түвшинд хүргэх боломжтой. Хэрэв зөвхөн хангалттай байдлыг хангамж өгөхийн тулд бид энгийн гэмт хэрэгжүүлэх энгийн хэмжээний хюристик болон тогтвортой алдагдлын үеийг санал болгож байна. Экстракторыг генераторын таамагласан дундаж динамик жингийг ойролцоогоор хүрг Бид өөр урт баримт, урт диалогын жинхэнэ даалгаврын талаар өөрсдийн аргыг үнэлдэг: GovReport, QMSum, arXiv. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд ДYLE нь GovReport болон QMSum дээр байгаа бүх арга замыг ашиглаж, арXiv дээр хүчтэй үр дүнг гаргаж чаддаг. Дараагийн шинжилгээ нь бидний үеийн үйл явцын тухай илэрхийлж чадах хөдөлгөөн нь илэрхийлж байна.', 'no': 'Name Men dei støttar framleis med å samansera lengre tekst. I denne papiret presenterer vi DYLE eit nytt dynamisk latent ekstraksjonstilnærming for abstraktiv lang inndata sammendrag. Name For å gjera tilstrekkelig overvåking, foreslår vi enkelt, men effektivt hekuristisk for utpakking av orakul, og eit uttrykk av konsistens mislukking, som styrer ekstraktoren til å omvende gjennomsnittleg dinamiske vekt som er foreslått av generatoren. Vi evaluerer metoden vårt på ulike langdokument og langdialogsamandringsoppgåver: GovReport, QMSum og arXiv. Eksperimentresultat viser at DYLE utfører alle eksisterande metodane på GovReport og QMSum, med opp til 6, 1 ROUGE, mens det gjer sterke resultat på arXiv. Dei fleire analysene viser at den foreslåde dinamiske vekta gjev tolkbare av genereringsprosessen vår.', 'pl': 'Modele oparte na transformatorach osiągnęły najnowocześniejszą wydajność podczas podsumowywania krótkich wejść. Nadal jednak zmagają się z podsumowaniem dłuższego tekstu. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy DYLE, nowe dynamiczne podejście do ekstrakcji utajonej do abstrakcyjnej streszczenia długich wejść. DYLE wspólnie szkoli ekstraktor i generator i traktuje wyodrębnione fragmenty tekstu jako zmienną utajoną, umożliwiając dynamiczne wagi uwagi na poziomie fragmentów podczas dekodowania. Aby zapewnić odpowiedni nadzór, proponujemy prostą, ale skuteczną heurystykę ekstrakcji wyroczni oraz termin utraty konsystencji, który zachęca ekstraktora do przybliżenia średnich wag dynamicznych przewidywanych przez generator. Oceniamy naszą metodę na różnych zadaniach podsumowywania długich dokumentów i długich dialogów: GovReport, QMSum i arXiv. Wyniki eksperymentu pokazują, że DYLE przewyższa wszystkie istniejące metody na GovReport i QMSum, przynosząc zyski do 6.1 ROUGE, przy jednoczesnym uzyskaniu silnych wyników na arXiv. Dalsza analiza pokazuje, że proponowane wagi dynamiczne zapewniają interpretację naszego procesu generowania.', 'ro': 'Modelele bazate pe transformatori au obținut performanțe de ultimă generație în rezumarea cu intrări scurte. Cu toate acestea, ei încă se luptă cu rezumarea textului mai lung. În această lucrare, prezentăm DYLE, o nouă abordare dinamică latentă de extracție pentru rezumarea abstractivă a intrărilor lungi. DYLE antrenează împreună un extractor și un generator și tratează fragmentele de text extrase ca variabile latentă, permițând greutăți dinamice de atenție la nivel de fragment în timpul decodificării. Pentru a oferi o supraveghere adecvată, propunem euristice simplă, dar eficientă pentru extracția oraculelor, precum și un termen de pierdere a consistenței, care încurajează extractorul să aproxime greutățile dinamice medii prevăzute de generator. Evaluăm metoda noastră pe diferite sarcini de rezumare a documentelor lungi și dialogurilor lungi: GovReport, QMSum și arXiv. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că DYLE depășește toate metodele existente pe GovReport și QMSum, cu câștiguri de până la 6,1 ROUGE, obținând în același timp rezultate puternice pe arXiv. Analizele suplimentare arată că greutățile dinamice propuse oferă interpretabilitatea procesului nostru de generare.', 'sr': 'Modeli koji su osnovani na transformaciji postigli su state-of-the-art performanci na sažetku kratkog unosa. Međutim, još se bore sa sažetkom dužeg teksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo DYLE, novi dinamični latentni pristup ekstrakciji za abstraktivni sažetak dugog unosa. DYLE zajedno vozi ekstraktor i generator i tretira izvlačene tekstske snippete kao latentnu varijable, omogućavajući dinamičnu težinu pažnje na nivou snippet a tokom dekodiranja. Da bismo obezbedili odgovarajuću nadzor, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu heuristiku za ekstrakciju orala, kao i termin gubitka konsekvencije, koji poticava ekstraktora da približi prosječnu dinamičnu težinu predviđenu generatorom. Procjenjujemo našu metodu o različitim zadacima za sažetanje dugog dokumenta i dugog dijaloga: GovReport, QMSum i arXiv. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da DYLE iznosi sve postojeće metode na GovReport i QMSum, uz dobitak do 6,1 ROUGE, dok donosi jake rezultate na arXiv. Daljnja analiza pokazuje da predložena dinamična težina pruža interpretabilnost procesa naše generacije.', 'si': 'Name ඒත්, ඔවුන් තවමත් ලොකු පාළුව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි DYLE විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ, නියම විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප Name අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය හෙයුරිස්ටික් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය හෙයුරිස්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති වාර්තාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න අපි වෙනස් ලොකු දස්ත සහ ලොකු සංවාදය සංවාදය වැඩේ අපේ විධානය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා: Govreport, QMSum, arXiv. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ DYLE Govreport සහ QMSum ගැන සියලුම විදියට සියලුම විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා, සියල තවත් විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා කියලා.', 'so': 'Transformer-based models have achieved state-of-the-art performance on short-input summarization.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay weli la dagaalamayaan qoraal dheeraad ah. Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa DYLE, taas oo ah qaab aad u dhaqdhaqaaqdo dhaqdhaqaaqa ee ugu dambeeya ee la soo jiiday hoos-dhaqdhaqaaq dheer ah. DYLE wuxuu si wada jir ah u tababarayaa wax ka soo baxo iyo wax dhaliye, wuxuuna ku daabacaa alaabta qoraalka la soo saaray sida bedelka ugu dambeeya, wuxuuna ku caawin karaa miisaanka dareemaha aad u fiiriso marka aad deynta. Si aan u bixino ilaaliyo ku filan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa fudud oo weli faa’iido u leh hiuristiyada ka soo baxa oranka iyo waqtiga khasaaraha oo joogtada ah, kaas oo ku dhiirrigelinaya wadajirka inuu ku dhoweeyo miisaanka dabeecada ah oo dhaqdhaqaalaha horay u sheegay. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaababkayaga ku saabsan dukumentiyada dheer iyo shaqooyinka diyaarinta dhaadheerka ah: GovReport, QMSum iyo arXiv. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in DYLE soo saaraa dhammaan methods existing on GovReport and QMSum, with gains up to 6.1 ROUGE, while producing strong results on arXiv. Analysis dheeraad ah waxaa muujiyaa in miisaanka la soo jeeday ay ay turjubaan qarnigeena.', 'sv': 'Transformarbaserade modeller har uppnått toppmoderna prestanda vid kortindata sammanfattning. Men de kämpar fortfarande med att sammanfatta längre text. I denna uppsats presenterar vi DYLE, en ny dynamisk latent extraktionsmetod för abstraktiv sammanfattning med lång input. DYLE tränar tillsammans en extractor och en generator och behandlar de extraherade textutdragen som den latenta variabeln, vilket möjliggör dynamisk uppmärksamhetsvikt på snippet-nivå under avkodning. För att ge tillräcklig övervakning föreslår vi enkel men effektiv heuristik för orakelextraktion samt en term för konsekvent förlust, som uppmuntrar extraktorn att ungefärliga de genomsnittliga dynamiska vikter som förutses av generatorn. Vi utvärderar vår metod på olika summeringsuppgifter med långa dokument och långa dialoger: GovReport, QMSum och arXiv. Experimentsresultat visar att DYLE överträffar alla befintliga metoder på GovReport och QMSum, med vinster upp till 6,1 ROUGE, samtidigt som det ger starka resultat på arXiv. Ytterligare analyser visar att de föreslagna dynamiska vikterna ger tolkning av vår produktionsprocess.', 'ur': 'ترفنسٹر بنیادی موڈل کوٹ اینٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ لیکن وہ ابھی دور کے متعلق لکھنے کے ساتھ کوشش کرتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے DYLE کو ایک نئی سیمالی لاٹینٹ اخراج طریقہ دکھایا ہے کہ آپٹراکتی طویل اخراج کے ذریعے۔ DYLE ایک اٹھانے والی اور ایک جینراٹر کے ساتھ ٹرین کرتا ہے اور اٹھانے والی ٹیکسٹ سنیپٹوں کو لٹینٹ ویرئیپٹ کے طور پر سمجھتا ہے، ڈیکوڈ کے موقع ڈینامیک سپیٹ-سطح کی توجه کی اجازت دیتا ہے. ہم نے مناسب نظر کے ساتھ سادھے اور اضافہ کے لئے سادھے اور اضافہ کے لئے اضافہ ہونے کے لئے سادھے اور اضافہ کے وقت کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو اضافہ کرنے والے کو ڈراتا ہے کہ جنرائٹر کی پیشنهاد کی میانگین سیاسی وزن کی تقریباً کرے۔ ہم اپنے طریقے کو مختلف لانگ ڈکومکٹم اور لانگ ڈائیلوگو کے ذریعے کاموں پر مقرر کرتے ہیں: GovReport, QMSum اور arXiv. Experiment results show that DYLE performs all existing methods on GovReport and QMSum, with gains up to 6.1 ROUGE, while yielding strong results on arXiv. اور اضافہ تحقیقات دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد دینامیک وزن ہماری نسل پرسس کی تفسیر قابلیت دیتا ہے.', 'ta': 'மாற்று அடிப்படையான மாதிரிகள் சிறிய உள்ளீட்டு சுருக்கமைப்பில் உள்ள- கலை செயல்பாட்டின் நிலையில் பெற்ற ஆனால் அவர்கள் இன்னும் நீண்ட உரையை சுருக்கும் போராடுகிறார்கள். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் DYLE காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஒரு புதிய புதிய தேவையான வெளியீட்டு நெருக்கமான நீண்ட உள்ளீட்டு சுர Name போதுமான கண்காணிப்பு வழங்குவதற்கு, நாம் சுலபமான ஆனாலும் வெளியீட்டிற்கு இயல்பான உயரம் மற்றும் ஒரு நிரந்தரமான இழப்பு வாக்கியத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்.  @ info Name மேலும் ஆராய்ச்சி காட்டுகிறது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட இயந்திர அளவுகள் எங்கள் தலைமுறையின் விளக்கம் கொடு', 'uz': "Comment Lekin, ular yana uzun matn bilan harakat qiladi. Bu qogʻozda biz DYLE hozir qilamiz, yangi dynamic latex extraction usulini abstraktiv kiritish muhit qilish uchun. Name Muddati taʼminlovchi bo'lishi uchun biz oddiy va foydalanuvchi heuritik va davom etish davomida so'rayapmiz. Bu tuzuvchi generator koʻrsatilgan oddiy dynamik vektlarini qisqarishga foydalanadi. @ info: status Name Koʻproq taʼminlovchi esa, taʼminlovchi dynamik vektlarimizni avlod qilishni anglatadi.", 'vi': 'Các mô hình biến hình đã đạt được trình độ nghệ thuật trong việc tổng kết ngắn. Tuy nhiên, họ vẫn tranh cãi với việc tổng kết văn bản dài hơn. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu DSố, một cách tiếp cận tiềm năng mới cho việc trích xuất lâu dài trừu tượng. DSố này được huấn luyện một máy hút và một máy phát điện. Đối xử với các phần chữ trích ra là biến tiềm năng tiềm ẩn, cho phép lượng chú ý cấp độ hạt động trong thời gian giải mã. Để cung cấp giám sát thích hợp, chúng tôi đề nghị thần kinh đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả cho việc trích xuất nhà tiên tri cũng như một khoảng thời gian mất cân bằng, điều đó thúc đẩy cho máy trích dẫn ước lượng các tạ khí động trung bình được dự đoán bởi máy phát điện. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi về các công việc tóm tắt dài tài liệu và lâu thoại: Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy DYPE sử dụng tất cả các phương pháp có trên kênh GovReport và QMSum, với các loại tăng lên đến 6.1 RWOG, trong khi cung cấp kết quả mạnh về ArXi. Phân tích tiếp theo cho thấy các tạ khí động đề nghị có thể hiểu được quá trình sản xuất của chúng ta.', 'bg': 'Моделите, базирани на трансформатори, са постигнали най-съвременни резултати при обобщаване на кратки входове. Въпреки това, те все още се борят с обобщаването на по-дълъг текст. В тази статия представяме нов динамичен латентен подход за екстракция за абстрактно обобщаване на дълги входове. Съвместно тренира екстрактор и генератор и третира извлечените текстови фрагменти като латентна променлива, позволявайки динамични тегла на вниманието на ниво откъс по време на декодирането. За осигуряване на адекватен надзор предлагаме проста, но ефективна евристика за екстракция на оракул, както и термин за загуба на консистенция, който насърчава екстрактора да приближи средните динамични тегла, прогнозирани от генератора. Ние оценяваме метода си по различни задачи за обобщаване на дълги документи и дълги диалози: ГовReport, QMSum и arXiv. Резултатите от експеримента показват, че ДИЛЕ превъзхожда всички съществуващи методи на GovReport и QMSum, като същевременно дава силни резултати на arXiv. Допълнителният анализ показва, че предложените динамични тежести осигуряват интерпретация на нашия процес на генериране.', 'nl': 'Transformatorgebaseerde modellen hebben state-of-the-art prestaties bereikt op korte input samenvatting. Toch worstelen ze nog steeds met het samenvatten van langere tekst. In dit artikel presenteren we DYLE, een nieuwe dynamische latente extractie benadering voor abstractieve long-input samenvatting. DYLE traint gezamenlijk een extractor en een generator en behandelt de geëxtraheerde tekstfragmenten als de latente variabele, waardoor dynamische aandachtsgewichten op snippetniveau tijdens het decoderen mogelijk zijn. Om adequaat toezicht te bieden, stellen we eenvoudige maar effectieve heuristieken voor orakelextractie voor, evenals een term voor consistentieverlies voor, die de extractor aanmoedigt om de gemiddelde dynamische gewichten te benaderen die door de generator worden voorspeld. We evalueren onze methode op verschillende lange documenten en lange dialoog samenvattingstaken: GovReport, QMSum en arXiv. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat DYLE alle bestaande methoden op GovReport en QMSum overtreft, met winsten tot 6.1 ROUGE, terwijl het sterke resultaten oplevert op arXiv. Verdere analyse toont aan dat de voorgestelde dynamische gewichten interpreteerbaarheid bieden van ons productieproces.', 'da': 'Transformer-baserede modeller har opnået state-of-the-art ydeevne ved korte input summering. Men de kæmper stadig med at opsummere længere tekst. I denne artikel præsenterer vi DYLE, en ny dynamisk latent ekstraktionstilgang til abstraktiv lang input opsummering. DYLE træner i fællesskab en ekstraktionsenhed og en generator og behandler de ekstraherede tekststykker som den latente variabel, hvilket tillader dynamiske opmærksomhedsvægte på snippet-niveau under afkodning. For at give tilstrækkelig overvågning foreslår vi enkle, men effektive heuristikker til orakelekstraktion samt en konsistens tab term, som opfordrer ekstraktionsmaskinen til at omtale de gennemsnitlige dynamiske vægte, der forudsiges af generatoren. Vi evaluerer vores metode på forskellige opgaver med lange dokumenter og lange dialoger: GovReport, QMSum og arXiv. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at DYLE overgår alle eksisterende metoder på GovReport og QMSum, med gevinster på op til 6,1 ROUGE, mens de giver stærke resultater på arXiv. Yderligere analyse viser, at de foreslåede dynamiske vægte giver fortolkning af vores produktionsproces.', 'hr': 'Modeli koji su temeljeni na transformaciji postigli su izvršnost umjetnosti na sažetku kratkog ulaza. Međutim, oni se i dalje bore sa sažetkom dužeg teksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo DYLE, novi dinamični latentni pristup ekstrakciji za abstraktivni sažetak dugog ulaza. DYLE zajedno vozi ekstraktor i generator i tretira izvlačene tekstske snippete kao latentnu varijable, omogućavajući dinamičnu težinu pažnje na nivou snippet a tijekom dekodiranja. Da bi osigurali odgovarajuću nadzor, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali učinkovitu heuristiku za ekstrakciju orala, kao i termin gubitka konsekvencije, koji potiče ekstraktora da približi prosječnu dinamičnu težinu predviđenu generatorom. Procjenjujemo našu metodu o različitim zadacima za sažetak dugog dokumenta i dugog dijaloga: GovReport, QMSum i arXiv. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da DYLE iznosi sve postojeće metode na GovReport i QMSum, uz dobivanje do 6,1 ROUGE, dok donosi jake rezultate na arXiv. Daljnja analiza pokazuje da predložena dinamična težina pruža interpretabilnost procesa naše generacije.', 'id': 'Model berdasarkan Transformer telah mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art pada ringkasan input pendek. Namun, mereka masih berjuang dengan menghitung teks yang lebih panjang. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan DYLE, pendekatan ekstraksi latent dinamik novel untuk resumsi input panjang abstraktif. DYLE bersama-sama melatih sebuah ekstraktor dan generator dan memperlakukan snippets teks ekstrakt sebagai variabel latent, memungkinkan berat perhatian tingkat snippet dinamik selama dekoding. Untuk menyediakan pengawasan yang tepat, kami mengusulkan heuristik sederhana namun efektif untuk ekstraksi orakul dan istilah kehilangan konsistensi, yang mendorong ekstraktor untuk mendekati berat dinamik rata-rata yang diprediksi oleh generator. Kami mengevaluasi metode kami pada tugas ringkasan dokumen panjang dan dialog panjang yang berbeda: GovReport, QMSum, dan arXiv. Experiment results show that DYLE outperforms all existing methods on GovReport and QMSum, with gains up to 6.1 ROUGE, while yielding strong results on arXiv.  Further analysis shows that the proposed dynamic weights provide interpretability of our generation process.', 'de': 'Transformatorbasierte Modelle haben eine State-of-the-Art-Performance bei der Kurzeingabezusammenfassung erreicht. Allerdings haben sie immer noch Schwierigkeiten, längere Texte zusammenzufassen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir DYLE vor, einen neuartigen dynamischen latenten Extraktionsansatz für die abstraktive Long-Input-Zusammenfassung. DYLE trainiert gemeinsam einen Extraktor und einen Generator und behandelt die extrahierten Textfragmente als latente Variable, wodurch dynamische Aufmerksamkeitsgewichte auf Snippet-Ebene während der Dekodierung ermöglicht werden. Um eine adäquate Überwachung zu gewährleisten, schlagen wir eine einfache, aber effektive Heuristik für Orakelextraktion sowie einen Konsistenzverlust-Term vor, der den Extraktor dazu ermutigt, die vom Generator vorhergesagten durchschnittlichen dynamischen Gewichte anzunähern. Wir evaluieren unsere Methode auf verschiedenen Langdokument- und Langdialogzusammenfassungsaufgaben: GovReport, QMSum und arXiv. Die Ergebnisse der Experimente zeigen, dass DYLE alle bestehenden Methoden auf GovReport und QMSum übertrifft, mit Zuwächsen bis zu 6.1 ROUGE, während es starke Ergebnisse auf arXiv liefert. Weitere Analysen zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen dynamischen Gewichte Interpretierbarkeit unseres Erzeugungsprozesses ermöglichen.', 'ko': '변압기 기반의 모델은 짧은 입력 집합 방면에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었다.그러나 그들은 여전히 비교적 긴 텍스트를 총결하기 어렵다.본고에서 우리는 추상적인 긴 입력 요약에 사용되는 새로운 동적 잠재적 추출 방법을 제시했다.DYLE는 추출기와 생성기를 연합하여 훈련하고 추출된 텍스트 세션을 잠재적인 변수로 간주하며 디코딩 기간에 동적 세션 단계의 주의 권한을 허용합니다.충분한 감독을 제공하기 위해서, 우리는oracle 추출에 간단하고 효과적인 계발식 방법과 일치성 손실 항목을 제시했다. 이것은 추출 프로그램이 생성기 예측의 평균 동적 중요도와 비슷하도록 장려한다.GovReport, QMSum,arXiv 등 다양한 긴 문서와 긴 대화 요약 작업에 대해 평가합니다.실험 결과 GovReport와 QMSum에서 DYLE의 성능은 기존의 모든 방법보다 우수했고 이득은 6.1연지였으며 ARXiv에서는 좋은 결과를 얻었다.진일보한 분석에 의하면 제시된 동태적 중요성은 우리의 생성 과정에 해석성을 제공했다.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر بر اساس تغییر\u200cپذیر\u200cکننده\u200cها اجرای وضعیت هنری بر اساس تعداد ورودی کوتاه رسیده\u200cاند. ولی هنوز با جمع کردن متن بیشتر مبارزه می کنند. در این کاغذ، ما DYLE را نشان می دهیم، یک روش اخراج تاریک تاریک تاریک تاریک تاریک تاریک برای جمع کردن طولانی ورودی abstractive. DYLE با همدیگر یک خارج کننده و یک ژنراتور را تمرین می\u200cکند و متن خارج شده را به عنوان متغیر latent درمان می\u200cکند، که اجازه می\u200cدهد وزن توجه سطح تنفس\u200cهای دینامیک در زمان decoding. برای تهیه کنترل مناسب، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که هوریستیک ساده و تاثیر برای اخراج کردن اوراکل و کلمه\u200cای از دست دادن هماهنگی، که اخراج کننده را تشویق می\u200cدهد تا وزن\u200cهای داینامیک متوسط را که توسط ژنرالر پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند تقریباً تقریباً  ما روش خودمون را در مورد کارهای جمع کردن مدت طولانی و صحبت طولانی ارزیابی می کنیم: GovReport, QMSum و arXiv. نتایج تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که DYLE تمام روش\u200cهای موجود در GovReport و QMSum، با رسیدن به 6.1 ROUGE، در حالی که نتیجه\u200cهای قوی روی arXiv را ارائه می\u200cدهد. تحلیل بیشتری نشان می دهد که وزن های پیشنهاد دینامیک قابلیت تعبیر فرایند نسل ما را می دهد.', 'tr': "= Ýöne olar heniz hem uzak metini gutarmak bilen mücadele edýärler. Bu kagyzda, DYLE'i abstraktiw uzak girişi jemgyýeti üçin bir dynamik geçişik taýýarlamak üçin tassyklandyrýarys. DYLE birbirlerine bir çekişçi we jeneratör şeklinde çizdirilen metin snippetlerini geçici bir çeşitli şeklinde gözetleýär ve bu şekilde deşikliklerde dinamik snippet seviyesinin dikkatini çekirýär. Doýerli gözetleme üçin, orak a çmak üçin basit we etkinlik heuristikleri we daýarlyk ýitirmek üçin teklip berýäris. Bu ýüklemek üçin ýitirmek üçin janlaýyn ortalama dinamik ölçülerini golaýlaýar. Biz öz yönümizi farklı uzak sened we uzak dialogyň jemgyýetlerini çykýarys: GovReport, QMSum we arXiv. Testler netijesi DYLE GovReport we QMSum'da bolan ähli ýagdaýlaryň üstünde bolup geçýändigini görkezýär. ArXiv'de güýçli netijesi bar. Daha gowy analyzasy teklip eden dinamik taýýarlaryň biziň jenaplarymyzyň işlemleriniň jynlaýyşlygyny saýlaýandygyny görkezýär.", 'sw': 'Mradi wenye asili ya zamani wamefanikiwa kufanya kazi ya sanaa kwa muhtasari mfupi wa habari. Hata hivyo, bado wanapambana na kuandika muhtasari wa muda mrefu. Katika karatasi hii, tunawasilisha DYLE, njia ya hivi karibuni ya kuchaguliwa kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa muda mrefu wa kujitolea. DYLE inamfundisha pamoja mtengenezaji na mtengenezaji na kuthibiti vifaa vya maandishi vilivyotolewa kama mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni, na kusaidia uzito wa kiwango cha vifaa vya kupunguza viwango vya kidini wakati wa kupungua. Ili kutoa ufuatiliaji wa kutosha, tunapendekeza viungo rahisi lakini vyenye ufanisi zaidi kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa ora pamoja na muhula wa kupoteza kwa muda mrefu, ambao unahamasisha mchumaji kumkaribia uzito wa wastani wa kimapenzi unaotabiriwa na mtayarishaji. We evaluate our method on different long-document and long-dialogue summarization tasks: GovReport, QMSum, and arXiv.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba DYLE inaonyesha njia zote zilizopo kwenye Taarifa za Serikali na QMSum, na kupata mafanikio ya kufikia 6.1, wakati huo unatoa matokeo makubwa kwenye arXiv. Uchambuzi zaidi unaonyesha kuwa mizani zilizopendekezwa zinatoa ufafanuzi wa mchakato wetu wa kizazi.', 'af': "Name Maar hulle struikel nog steeds met die opsomming van langer teks. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons DYLE 'n novele dinamiese latente uittrekking toegang vir abstraktiewe lang-invoer opsomming. DYLE trein bymekaar 'n ekstraktor en 'n genereerder en behandel die uitgevoerde teks snippets as die latente veranderlike, toelaat dinamiese snippet- vlak aandagsverke tydens dekodering. Om adequate supervisie te verskaf, voorstel ons eenvoudig nog effektief heuristiek vir orakel uittrekking en ook 'n konsistensie verloor term, wat die uittrekking bevestig om die gemiddelde dinamiese weegte wat deur die genereerder voorskou is om te besoek. Ons evalueer ons metode op verskillende lang- dokument en lang- dialoog opsomming opdragte: GovReport, QMSum en arXiv. Eksperiment resultate vertoon dat DYLE uitvoer alle bestaande metodes op GovReport en QMSum, met opsigte tot 6. 1 ROUGE, terwyl sterk resultate op arXiv gegee word. Verdere analisie wys dat die voorgestelde dinamiese weegte verskaf uitleggbare van ons generasieproses.", 'sq': 'Modelet me bazë në transformues kanë arritur shfaqjen më të lartë në përmbledhjen e input të shkurtër. However, they still struggle with summarizing longer text.  Në këtë letër, prezantojmë DYLE, një metodë dinamike të nxjerrjes së fshehtë për përmbledhjen abstraktive të hyrjes së gjatë. DYLE trajnon së bashku një nxjerrës dhe një gjenerator dhe trajton shkurtimet e tekstit të nxjerrë si ndryshuesin e fshehtë, duke lejuar pesha dinamike të vëmendjes në nivelin e shkurtimit gjatë dekodimit. Për të siguruar mbikqyrje të përshtatshme, ne propozojmë heuristikë të thjeshta por të efektshme për nxjerrjen e orakullit si dhe një term ë të humbjes së konsistencës, që inkurajon nxitësin të përafërtojë peshat dinamike mesatare të parashikuara nga gjeneratori. Ne vlerësojmë metodën tonë në detyra të ndryshme të përmbledhjes së dokumenteve të gjata dhe të dialogut të gjatë: GovReport, QMSum dhe arXiv. Experiment results show that DYLE outperforms all existing methods on GovReport and QMSum, with gains up to 6.1 ROUGE, while yielding strong results on arXiv.  Analiza e mëtejshme tregon se peshat dinamike të propozuara ofrojnë interpretueshmërinë e procesit tonë të gjeneratës.', 'hy': "Տանֆերմերների հիմնված մոդելները հասել են լավագույն արդյունքներին կարճ ներմուծքի համառոտագրման վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք դեռևս պայքարում են ավելի երկար տեքստի համառոտագրման հետ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք DYLE-ը, նոր դինամիկ թաքնված վերացման մոտեցումը վերացրատիվ երկար ներմուծների համառոտագրման համար: DYLE միասին վարժեցնում է դուրս բերող և գեներատոր և վերաբերում է դուրս բերած տեքստի կտորները որպես թաքնված փոփոխականը, թույլ տալով դինամիկ կտորի ուշադրության մակարդակի կշիռներ դեկոդավորման ժամանակ: Որպեսզի ապահովենք բավարար վերահսկողություն, մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ, սակայն արդյունավետ հորիստիկ, որպեսզի դուրս բերենք օրաքլ, ինչպես նաև կորստիկանության կորստի տերմին, որը խրախուսում է դուրս բերողին մոտավորել գեներատորի կանխատեսված միջին Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մեթոդը տարբեր երկար փաստաթղթերի և երկար պատմությունների համառոտագրման խնդիրների վրա' GovNews, QMSum և ArXv: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ DYLE-ը գերազանցում է GovNews և QMSum-ի գոյություն ունեցող բոլոր մեթոդները, մինչև 6.1 ROUGe-ի շահույթը, մինչդեռ հզոր արդյունքներ է ստանում Arxiv-ի վրա: Ավելի վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ առաջարկված դինամիկ կշիռները մեր սերնդի գործընթացի մեկնաբանելիությունն են:", 'am': 'የፊደል ሠሌዳዎች አቋራጭ አቋራጭ የ-የ-አርእስት አግኝተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን የረጅም ጽሑፍ በመጠቀም ይጋደላሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ዲያሌን፣ አዲስ አዲስ አዲስ የረጅም የረጅም የውጤት አቀማመጥ ማቀናቀል እናቀርባለን፡፡ DYLE የተጠቃሚ እና አዲስ አዋጅ ያስተማርካል እና የተለየ የጽሑፍ መስኮቶችን በአሁኑ ጊዜ እንደምትለወጥ ያስተካክላል፡፡ በጠቃሚ ስልጣንን ለማስጠጋት፣ ለቀላል የኦሮቲካዊ ውጤት እና ለጥያቄ የክስ ቁጥር እና በጥያቄው የጥረት ቁጥር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የረጅም ሰነድ እና የረጅም አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ ስራዎችን እናስተውሉናለን፡፡ ከፈተናው ውጤቶች DYLE በአርክሲብ ላይ ብርቱ ፍሬዎችን እንዲሰጥ የኖረውን ጉዳይ እና የQMSም ሥርዓቶች ሁሉ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ Further analysis shows that the proposed dynamic weights provide the interpretation of the generation process.', 'az': "Transformer-tabanlı modellər qısa girdi təmizlənməsi üçün vəziyyət-o-the-art performansını başa çatdı. Lakin onlar hələ də uzun məktubları azaltmaq üçün mübahisə edirlər. Bu kağızda DYLE'i, abstraktiv uzun girdi təmizlənməsi üçün yeni dinamik latent ekstraksyon approach göstəririk. DYLE birlikdə bir ekstraktor və generator tələb edir və çıxarılmış mətn snippetlərini latent dəyişiklik kimi tələb edir. Dekodlama sırasında dinamik snippet səviyyəsi təsirlərinin a ğırlığına müvəffəq edər. Yeterli gözətçilik təyin etmək üçün, biz oral çıxartmaq üçün basit, hətta etkili heuristik təklif edirik, həmçinin sürəkliyi ziyana uğramaq mərasimi də təklif edirik ki, extraktora generator təklif etdiyi ortalama dinamik a ğırlığını yaxınlaşdırmağa məcbur edir. Biz metodlarımızı müxtəlif uzun belədir və uzun dialoğu toplama işləri ilə değerləşdiririk: GovReport, QMSum və arXiv. Təcrübə sonuçları DYLE'nin GovReport və QMSum'un bütün mövcuddur metodlarını artırdığını göstərir, arXiv'in güclü sonuçlarını artırmaq üçün 6.1 ROUGE qədər artırdı. Daha çox analizi göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş dinamik ağırlığın nəslimizin prosesinin yorumluluğunu təsdiqləyir.", 'bn': 'ট্রান্সফার্ন ভিত্তিক মডেল সংক্ষিপ্ত ইনপুটের সারসংক্ষেপের উপর শিল্প-শিল্পের অবস্থান অর্জন করেছে। তবে তারা এখনও অনেক দীর্ঘ লেখার সাথে লড়াই করছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডিয়ালেকে উপস্থাপন করছি, যা একটি নোভেল ডায়ান্ডামিক সাম্প্রতিক বের করার উপায়। DYLE একত্রে এক্সট্রেক্টর এবং জেনারেটর প্রশিক্ষণ দেয় এবং সাম্প্রতিক ভেরিয়েল হিসেবে বিনিময় করে প্রকাশিত টেক্সট স্নিপেটের প্রশিক্ষণ দেয় যথেষ্ট পর্যবেক্ষণ প্রদানের জন্য আমরা সাধারণ হারিস্টিকের প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি যাতে সাধারণ এবং সাথে সাধারণ ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হারানোর জন্য, যা জেনারেটরের ভবিষ্যৎ কর আমরা বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘ নথিপত্র এবং দীর্ঘ আলোচনার সংক্ষেপের কাজে আমাদের পদ্ধতি মূল্যায়ন করি: গভরিপোর্ট, কিউএমএসাম এবং আর্কিভ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে DYLE সরকারি রিপোর্ট এবং কিউএমএসামে সকল বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করে, যার ফলে ৬. ১ রুজের পর্যন্ত অর্জন করে, আর্কিভে শক্তিশ আরো বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত ডায়ান্ডামিক ওজন আমাদের প্রজন্মের প্রক্রিয়ার ব্যাখ্যা প্রদা', 'ca': "Els models basats en transformadors han aconseguit un rendiment més avançat en una resumida curta d'entrada. Tot i així, encara lluiten amb resumir text més llarg. En aquest paper, presentem DYLE, un nou enfocament dinàmic d'extracció latent per a una resumida abstractiva de llarga entrada. DYLE entrena conjuntament un extractor i un generador i tracta els fragments de text extraïts com la variable latent, permetent pesos dinàmics d'atenció a nivell de fragments durant la decodificació. Per proporcionar una supervisió adequada, proposem heurístics simples però efectives per a l'extracció de l'oracle i un terme de pèrdua de consistencia, que anima l'extractor a aproximar els pesos dinàmics mitjans predits pel generador. Evaluam el nostre mètode en diverses tasques de resum de llargs documents i diàleg: GovReport, QMSum i arXiv. Els resultats d'experiments demostren que DYLE supera tots els mètodes existents en GovReport i QMSum, amb guanys fins a 6,1 ROUGE, mentre que produeix forts resultats en arXiv. Una altra anàlisi mostra que els pesos dinàmics proposats proporcionen interpretabilitat del nostre procés de generació.", 'bs': 'Modeli koji su temeljeni na transformaciji postigli su state-of-the-art performanci na sažetku kratkog unosa. Međutim, oni se i dalje bore sa sažetkom dužeg teksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo DYLE, novi dinamični latentni pristup ekstrakciji za abstraktivni sažetak dugog ulaza. DYLE zajedno vozi ekstraktor i generator i tretira izvlačene tekstske snippete kao latentnu varijable, omogućavajući dinamičnu težinu pažnje na nivou snippet a tijekom dekodiranja. Da bi osigurali odgovarajuću nadzor, predlažemo jednostavnu, ali efikasnu heuristiku za ekstrakciju orala, kao i termin gubitka konsekvencije, koji poticava ekstraktora da približi prosječnu dinamičnu težinu predviđenu generatorom. Procjenjujemo našu metodu o različitim dugovim dokumentima i dugovim zadacima sažetke dijaloga: GovReport, QMSum i arXiv. Rezultati eksperimentacija pokazuju da DYLE iznosi sve postojeće metode na GovReport i QMSum, uz dobivanje do 6,1 ROUGE, dok donosi jake rezultate na arXiv. Daljnja analiza pokazuje da predložena dinamična težina pruža interpretabilnost procesa naše generacije.', 'et': 'Transformeritel põhinevad mudelid on saavutanud tipptasemel jõudluse lühikese sisendi kokkuvõtmisel. Siiski on neil endiselt raskusi pikema teksti kokkuvõtmisega. Käesolevas töös tutvustame DYLE-i, uudset dünaamilist latentse ekstraktsiooni lähenemisviisi abstraktiivse pikasisendi kokkuvõtmiseks. DYLE treenib ühiselt ekstraktorit ja generaatorit ning käsitleb ekstraheeritud tekstilõikeid latentse muutujana, võimaldades dekodeerimise ajal dünaamilist lõiketaseme tähelepanu kaaluda. Asjakohase järelevalve tagamiseks pakume välja lihtsat, kuid efektiivset heuristikat oraakeli ekstraheerimiseks ning konsistentsuse kadumise terminit, mis julgustab ekstraktorit ligikaudselt generaatori prognoositud keskmisi dünaamilisi kaalusid. Hindame oma meetodit erinevate pika dokumendi ja pika dialoogi kokkuvõtte ülesannete puhul: GovReport, QMSum ja arXiv. Eksperimentide tulemused näitavad, et DYLE ületab kõiki olemasolevaid meetodeid GovReport ja QMSum, saavutades kasu kuni 6.1 ROUGE, andes samal ajal tugevaid tulemusi arXiv. Täiendav analüüs näitab, et kavandatud dünaamilised kaalud tagavad meie tootmisprotsessi tõlgendatavuse.', 'cs': 'Modely založené na transformátorech dosáhly nejmodernějšího výkonu při shrnutí krátkých vstupů. Nicméně stále bojují s shrnutím delšího textu. V tomto článku představujeme DYLE, nový dynamický latentní extrakční přístup pro abstraktivní shrnutí dlouhých vstupů. DYLE společně trénuje extraktor a generátor a zachází s extrahovanými textovými úryvky jako s latentní proměnnou, což umožňuje dynamické váhy pozornosti na úrovni úryvků během dekódování. Pro zajištění adekvátního dohledu navrhujeme jednoduchou, ale efektivní heuristiku pro extrakci orákulů a termín ztráty konzistence, který extraktor povzbuzuje k aproximaci průměrných dynamických hmotností předpovídaných generátorem. Naši metodu hodnotíme na různých úlohách shrnutí dlouhých dokumentů a dlouhého dialogu: GovReport, QMSum a arXiv. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že DYLE překonává všechny existující metody na GovReport a QMSum, s zisky až 6.1 ROUGE, přičemž přináší silné výsledky na arXiv. Další analýza ukazuje, že navrhované dynamické hmotnosti poskytují interpretovatelnost našeho generačního procesu.', 'fi': 'Muuntajapohjaiset mallit ovat saavuttaneet huipputason suorituskyvyn lyhyen syötteen yhteenvedossa. He kuitenkin kamppailevat edelleen pitkien tekstien tiivistämisen kanssa. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme DYLE:n, uuden dynaamisen latentin ekstraktiomenetelmän abstraktiiviseen pitkän syötteen yhteenvetoon. DYLE kouluttaa yhdessä imurin ja generaattorin ja käsittelee purettuja tekstikatkelmia piilevänä muuttujana, mikä mahdollistaa dynaamisen katkelmatason huomiopainojen purkamisen aikana. Asianmukaisen valvonnan varmistamiseksi ehdotamme oraakkeliuuttoon yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta heuristiikkaa sekä konsistenssihäviötermiä, joka kannustaa uutinta likimäärimään generaattorin ennustamat keskimääräiset dynaamiset painot. Arvioimme menetelmäämme erilaisissa pitkän dokumentin ja pitkän dialogin yhteenvetotehtävissä: GovReport, QMSum ja arXiv. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että DYLE suoriutuu paremmin kuin kaikki olemassa olevat menetelmät GovReportissa ja QMSum-järjestelmässä, ja saavutti jopa 6.1 ROUGE-arvon, mutta tuottaa vahvoja tuloksia arXiv-tutkimuksessa. Jatkoanalyysi osoittaa, että ehdotetut dynaamiset painot mahdollistavat tuotantoprosessimme tulkittavuuden.', 'he': 'דוגמנים מבוססים בטרנספורטרים השיגו ביצועים חדשים בסדרה קצרה. בכל אופן, הם עדיין נאבקים בקיצור טקסט ארוך יותר. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים DYLE, גישה חדשה דינמית אולטינית לחיצה לסומריזציה אוסטרקטיבית של הכנסה ארוכה. DYLE מאמן יחד חולץ וגנרטור ותייחס לחתיכות הטקסט החולץ כהשתנה הסתורית, מאפשרת משקולות תשומת לב דינמיים ברמה החתיכות במהלך הפיתוח. To provide adequate supervision, we propose simple yet effective heuristics for oracle extraction as well as a consistency loss term, which encourages the extractor to approximate the averaged dynamic weights predicted by the generator.  אנו מעריכים את השיטה שלנו על משימות מסמכים ארוכים ודיולוגים ארוכים שונות: GovReport, QMSum, ו arXiv. תוצאות הניסויים מראות כי DYLE מציג את כל שיטות קיימות על GovReport ו QMSum, עם הרווחים עד 6.1 ROUGE, בזמן שהוביל תוצאות חזקות על arXiv. ניתוח נוסף מראה שהמשקלים הדינמיים המוצעים מספקים אפשרות לפרש את תהליך הדור שלנו.', 'sk': 'Modeli, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih, so dosegli vrhunsko zmogljivost pri kratkem povzetku vhodov. Vendar pa še vedno težko povzemajo daljše besedilo. V prispevku predstavljamo DYLE, nov dinamični latentni pristop ekstrakcije za abstraktivno povzetek dolgih vhodov. DYLE skupaj usposablja ekstraktor in generator ter izvlečene delčke besedila obravnava kot latentno spremenljivko, kar omogoča dinamične uteži pozornosti na ravni odsekov med dekodiranjem. Za zagotovitev ustreznega nadzora predlagamo enostavno, vendar učinkovito heuristiko za ekstrakcijo orakla in termin izgube konsistence, ki spodbuja ekstraktor k približevanju povprečnih dinamičnih uteži, ki jih napoveduje generator. Našo metodo ocenjujemo na različnih nalogah povzemanja dolgih dokumentov in dialogov: GovReport, QMSum in arXiv. Rezultati eksperimentov kažejo, da DYLE presega vse obstoječe metode na GovReportu in QMSum, z dobički do 6.1 ROUGE, hkrati pa daje močne rezultate na arXiv. Nadaljnja analiza kaže, da predlagane dinamične uteži zagotavljajo razlago našega procesa proizvodnje.', 'ha': "@ action: button Haƙĩƙa, suna yin jihãdi da matsayin nan ƙari. Ga wannan takardan da Muke halatar da DYLE, wata matabbata mai sauya na yanzu ta ƙara zuwa bakin da aka samu'ar da baka-durowa. @ info Dõmin ya ga masu tsari daidai, Munã ƙayyade kowanin heuristic masu iya amfani da shiryarwa ga masu karatun oracle da muhula da hasara daidaici, wanda ke kwaɗaitar masu tsakanin nauyi da za'a gabatar da shi. @ info: whatsthis Dakata ta nuna DYLE ke outperforme duk shiryoyin da ke jira kan GovRat da QMM, with gots up to 6.1 RUGE, while ƙarbuɗe strong fassarar kan arXif. Ana ƙari ya nuna cewa, ma'anar da aka buƙata, yana da fassarar fassarar rayuwarmu.", 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringTransform Nanging, dhewe isih njaluk luwih-njaluk tentang kanggo resmi-seneng luwih. DYLL DYLL Joint kanggo nyebah akeh apel sing nesaturan, kita ngubah akeh heuristik nggawe gerakan luwih dumadhi, lan akeh dumadhi sing perbudhakan bakal nguasai, sing ujaran dhéwé ngerayakno ujaran ketahanan luwih dumadhi sing apik gedhaya. Awak dhéwé éntukno nggawe method nang sampeyan long-document lan nggawe-dialog sumulasi dadi: GoVReport, XSMum lan arXv. Name Ndeleksyon langkung wigatining punika dipunangé karo nggawe jinaturan karo perusahaan winih kanggo ngerasar winih dhéwé.', 'bo': 'Transformer-based models have achieved state-of-the-art performance on short-input summarization. འོན་ཀྱང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གེ་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་མཉམ་དུ་འཐབ་རྩོད་བྱེད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོར་DYLE ལ་སྒྲུང་གཏོང་བའི་མཐུད་སྣང་ཚུལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤིག་རེད། DYLE jointly trains an extractor and a generator and treats the extracted text snippets as the latent variable, allowing dynamic snippet-level attention weights during decoding. DYLE jointly trains an extractor and a generator and treats the extracted text snippets as the latent variable, allowing dynamic snippet-level attention weights during decoding. ལྟ་བུའི་རྗེས་སུ་འཇུག་དགོས་པ་དེ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསལ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྗེས་ཐོག་ལས་ཕར་འཚོལ་ཞིང་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་ལ་འཛིན་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་ཚོར་མཁན་གྱི་ ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡིག་ཆ་རྩིས་མེད་པ་དང་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་བྱ་རིམ་འདིའི་ནང་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡ Experiment results show that DYLE outperforms all existing methods on GovReport and QMSum, with gains up to 6.1 ROUGE, while arXiv yields strong results. ཞིབ་དཔྱད་མང་ཙམ་བྱས་ན་འོངས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཚད་ལུས་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མི་རབས་པའི་ལས་འགུལ་ས'}
{'en': 'Hyperlink-induced Pre-training for Passage Retrieval in Open-domain Question Answering', 'pt': 'Procurando por conteúdo digitado em linguagem de sinais americana', 'ar': 'البحث عن محتوى بهجاء الأصابع بلغة الإشارة الأمريكية', 'es': 'Búsqueda de contenido escrito con los dedos en lenguaje de señas estadounidense', 'fr': 'Recherche de contenu orthographié par les doigts dans la langue des signes américaine', 'ja': 'アメリカ手話で指綴りのコンテンツを検索する', 'zh': '索美国手语指拼写', 'hi': 'अमेरिकी साइन लैंग्वेज में फिंगरस्पेल्ड सामग्री की खोज करना', 'ru': 'Поиск контента, написанного пальцем, на американском языке жестов', 'ga': 'Ag cuardach ábhar méarlitrithe i dTeanga Chomharthaíochta Mheiriceá', 'ka': 'ამერიკანის სიმბოლობის ენაში მოწყობილობის შემდგომარების ძებნა', 'hu': 'Az ujjbetűs tartalom keresése amerikai jelnyelven', 'el': 'Αναζήτηση για περιεχόμενο δακτυλογραφής στην Αμερικανική Νοηματική Γλώσσα', 'lt': 'Searching for fingerspelled content in American Sign Language', 'mk': 'Барам содржина со пишување на прстите во американскиот јазик на знаци', 'it': 'Ricerca di contenuti digitati nella lingua dei segni americana', 'kk': 'Американдық қолтаңбалау тілінде барлық емлелер мазмұнын іздеу', 'ms': 'Mencari kandungan ejaan jari dalam Bahasa Tanda Amerika', 'ml': 'American Sign Language', 'mt': 'Searching for fingerspelled content in American Sign Language', 'mn': 'Америкийн тэмдэгтийн хэл дээр хуруу үлгэрсэн contentsүүдийг хайж байна.', 'no': 'Søkjer etter innhald med fingerstaving i amerikansk signspråk', 'pl': 'Wyszukiwanie treści napisanych palcami w amerykańskim języku migowym', 'ro': 'Căutarea conținutului degetului ortografiat în limba americană a semnelor', 'sr': 'Tražim sadržaj napisanog prsta na američkom znakovnom jeziku', 'si': 'ඇමෙරිකාන් සංකේත භාෂයේ ඇඟුල් වර්ණය සම්බන්ධය හොයාගන්න', 'sv': 'Söker efter fingerstavat innehåll i amerikanskt teckenspråk', 'so': 'Raadinta waxyaabaha lagu qoray afka American Sign Language', 'ta': 'அமெரிக்க குறியீட்டு உள்ளடக்கத்தை தேடுகிறது', 'ur': 'انگلیسی سیگن زبان میں انگلیسی لیکل کے منصوبات کی تلاش کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Language', 'vi': 'Tìm kiếm tập tin đánh dấu bằng ngón tay trong ngôn ngữ American ký', 'bg': 'Търсене на съдържание с изписани пръсти в Американски език на жестовете', 'nl': 'Zoeken naar gespelde inhoud in Amerikaanse gebarentaal', 'da': 'Søgning efter fingerstavet indhold i amerikansk tegnsprog', 'hr': 'Tražim sadržaj napisanog prsta na američkom znakovnom jeziku', 'de': 'Suche nach Inhalten mit Fingerbuchstaben in Amerikanischer Gebärdensprache', 'ko': '미국 수화에서 손가락 맞춤법 검색', 'fa': 'جستجوی محتوای نوشته شده انگشت در زبان علامت آمریکایی', 'id': 'Mencari isi ejaan jari dalam Bahasa Tanda Amerika', 'sw': 'Searching for fingerspelled content in American Sign Language', 'af': 'Soek vir vinger gespel inhoud in Amerikaanse teken taal', 'tr': 'Amerikan Alam Dilinde barlanyn mazmunlary gözlenýär', 'sq': 'Duke kërkuar përmbajtjen e shkruar me gishta në gjuhën amerikane të shenjave', 'hy': 'Ամերիկյան ազդանշանների լեզվով մատներով գրված պարունակություն փնտրելը', 'am': 'Language', 'az': 'Amerikan ńįŇüaret Dilind…ô parmaq imzalamasńĪ i√ß…ôrisind…ô axtarńĪlńĪr', 'bn': 'আমেরিকান স্বাক্ষরের আঙ্গুল বানানো বিষয়বস্তু অনুসন্ধান করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Vyhledávání obsahu psaného prstem v americkém znakovém jazyce', 'bs': 'Tražim sadržaj napisanog prsta na američkom znakovnom jeziku', 'et': 'Otsing sõrmekirjaga sisu Ameerika viipekeeles', 'ca': 'Procurant contingut ortografiat dins el llenguatge americà de senyals', 'fi': 'Haetaan sormenkirjoitettua sisältöä kielellä Amerikkalainen viittomakieli', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'sk': 'Iskanje vsebine s prstom črkovane v Ameriškem znakovnem jeziku', 'he': 'Searching for fingerspelled content in American Sign Language', 'bo': 'American Sign Language ཐོག་ཏུ་དག་ཆ་བརྗོད་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་འཚོལ་བ'}
{'en': 'To alleviate the data scarcity problem in training question answering systems, recent works propose additional intermediate pre-training for dense passage retrieval (DPR). However, there still remains a large discrepancy between the provided upstream signals and the downstream question-passage relevance, which leads to less improvement. To bridge this gap, we propose the HyperLink-induced Pre-training (HLP), a method to pre-train the dense retriever with the text relevance induced by hyperlink-based topology within Web documents. We demonstrate that the hyperlink-based structures of dual-link and co-mention can provide effective relevance signals for large-scale pre-training that better facilitate downstream passage retrieval. We investigate the effectiveness of our approach across a wide range of open-domain QA datasets under zero-shot, few-shot, multi-hop, and out-of-domain scenarios. The experiments show our HLP outperforms the BM25 by up to 7 points as well as other pre-training methods by more than 10 points in terms of top-20 retrieval accuracy under the zero-shot scenario. Furthermore, HLP significantly outperforms other pre-training methods under the other scenarios.', 'fr': "Le traitement du langage naturel pour les vidéos en langue des signes, y compris des tâches telles que la reconnaissance, la traduction et la recherche, est crucial pour rendre les technologies d'intelligence artificielle accessibles aux personnes sourdes, et suscite de plus en plus d'intérêt dans la recherche ces dernières années. Dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de la recherche de mots clés ou d'expressions clés orthographiés par des doigts dans des vidéos en langage gestuel brut. Il s'agit d'une tâche importante car un contenu important en langue des signes est souvent transmis par l'orthographe digitale et, à notre connaissance, cette tâche n'a jamais été étudiée auparavant. Nous proposons un modèle de bout en bout pour cette tâche, FSS-Net, qui détecte conjointement l'orthographe et la met en correspondance avec une séquence de texte. Nos expériences, réalisées sur un vaste ensemble de données public sur l'orthographe ASL dans la nature, montrent l'importance de la détection de l'orthographe en tant que composante d'un modèle de recherche et de récupération. Notre modèle surpasse de manière significative les méthodes de base adaptées des travaux antérieurs sur des tâches connexes.", 'es': 'El procesamiento del lenguaje natural para los videos en lenguaje de señas, incluidas tareas como reconocimiento, traducción y búsqueda, es crucial para hacer que las tecnologías de inteligencia artificial sean accesibles para las personas sordas, y está ganando interés en la investigación en los últimos años. En este artículo, abordamos el problema de la búsqueda de palabras clave o frases clave escritas con los dedos en los vídeos de lenguaje de señas sin procesar. Esta es una tarea importante, ya que el contenido significativo en el lenguaje de signos se transmite a menudo a través del deletreo digital y, hasta donde sabemos, la tarea no se ha estudiado antes. Proponemos un modelo integral para esta tarea, FSS-Net, que detecta conjuntamente la ortografía digital y la relaciona con una secuencia de texto. Nuestros experimentos, realizados en un gran conjunto de datos públicos de ortografía digital de ASL en estado salvaje, muestran la importancia de la detección de ortografía digital como componente de un modelo de búsqueda y recuperación. Nuestro modelo supera significativamente los métodos de referencia adaptados del trabajo anterior en tareas relacionadas.', 'ar': 'تعد معالجة اللغة الطبيعية لفيديو لغة الإشارة - بما في ذلك مهام مثل التعرف والترجمة والبحث - أمرًا بالغ الأهمية لجعل تقنيات الذكاء الاصطناعي في متناول الأفراد الصم ، وتكتسب اهتمامًا بحثيًا في السنوات الأخيرة. في هذه الورقة ، نتناول مشكلة البحث عن الكلمات الرئيسية ذات الهجاء بالأصابع أو العبارات الرئيسية في مقاطع الفيديو بلغة الإشارة الأولية. هذه مهمة مهمة لأن المحتوى المهم في لغة الإشارة يتم نقله غالبًا عن طريق هجاء الأصابع ، وعلى حد علمنا لم تتم دراسة المهمة من قبل. نقترح نموذجًا شاملاً لهذه المهمة ، FSS-Net ، يكتشف بشكل مشترك تهجئة الأصابع ويطابقها مع تسلسل نصي. تُظهر تجاربنا ، التي تم إجراؤها على مجموعة بيانات عامة كبيرة لتهجئة أصابع ASL في البرية ، أهمية اكتشاف هجاء الأصابع كعنصر من مكونات نموذج البحث والاسترجاع. يتفوق نموذجنا بشكل كبير على الأساليب الأساسية التي تم تكييفها من العمل السابق في المهام ذات الصلة.', 'pt': 'O processamento de linguagem natural para vídeo em linguagem de sinais --- incluindo tarefas como reconhecimento, tradução e pesquisa --- é crucial para tornar as tecnologias de inteligência artificial acessíveis a surdos e está ganhando interesse de pesquisa nos últimos anos. Neste artigo, abordamos o problema de pesquisar palavras-chave ou frases-chave digitadas em vídeos brutos de língua de sinais. Esta é uma tarefa importante, uma vez que o conteúdo significativo na língua de sinais é muitas vezes transmitido através da ortografia e, até onde sabemos, a tarefa não foi estudada antes. Propomos um modelo de ponta a ponta para esta tarefa, o FSS-Net, que detecta a ortografia digital em conjunto e a associa a uma sequência de texto. Nossos experimentos, feitos em um grande conjunto de dados público de digitação ASL na natureza, mostram a importância da detecção de digitação como um componente de um modelo de busca e recuperação. Nosso modelo supera significativamente os métodos de linha de base adaptados de trabalhos anteriores em tarefas relacionadas.', 'ja': '認識、翻訳、検索などのタスクを含む手話ビデオの自然言語処理は、人工知能技術を聴覚障害者がアクセスできるようにするために重要であり、近年研究上の関心が高まっています。本稿では，生手話動画における指綴りのキーワードやキーフレーズの検索の問題について述べる。これは、手話の重要なコンテンツがしばしば指綴りを介して伝えられ、私たちの知る限り、その課題はこれまで研究されていなかったため、重要な課題です。このタスクのためのエンドツーエンドのモデル、FSS - Netを提案します。FSS - Netは、フィンガースペーシングを共同で検出し、テキストシーケンスにマッチングします。私たちの実験は、野生におけるASL指綴りの大規模な公開データセット上で行われ、検索および検索モデルの構成要素としての指綴り検出の重要性を示しています。当社のモデルは、関連するタスクに関する以前の作業から適応されたベースライン方法を大幅に上回っています。', 'hi': 'पहचान, अनुवाद और खोज--- जैसे कार्यों सहित सांकेतिक भाषा वीडियो---के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कृत्रिम बुद्धिमत्ता प्रौद्योगिकियों को बहरे व्यक्तियों के लिए सुलभ बनाने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है, और हाल के वर्षों में अनुसंधान रुचि प्राप्त कर रहा है।  इस पेपर में, हम कच्चे साइन लैंग्वेज वीडियो में फिंगरस्पेल्ड कीवर्ड या कुंजी वाक्यांशों की खोज करने की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं।  यह एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है क्योंकि संकेत भाषा में महत्वपूर्ण सामग्री अक्सर उंगलियों की वर्तनी के माध्यम से व्यक्त की जाती है, और हमारे ज्ञान के लिए कार्य का पहले अध्ययन नहीं किया गया है।  हम इस कार्य के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एफएसएस-नेट, जो संयुक्त रूप से फिंगरस्पेलिंग का पता लगाता है और इसे टेक्स्ट अनुक्रम से मेल खाता है। हमारे प्रयोगों, जंगली में एएसएल fingerspelling के एक बड़े सार्वजनिक डेटासेट पर किया गया है, एक खोज और पुनर्प्राप्ति मॉडल के एक घटक के रूप में fingerspelling का पता लगाने के महत्व को दिखाने के लिए।  हमारा मॉडल संबंधित कार्यों पर पूर्व कार्य से अनुकूलित बेसलाइन विधियों को काफी बेहतर बनाता है।', 'zh': '手语视频之自然语言处---兼识译搜索之务---于使聋人能用人工智能术至重,且近年方兴。  于本文中,决在原始手语视频中搜索指拼写关键字或要短语。  此一务也,手语之要者,常以指拼写传之,以吾所知,未尝究也。  建一端到端,FSS-Net共检指拼写序其文本。 吾实验在野ASL指拼写之大公共数据集上,见指拼写检以为搜求组件要。  吾模形显优于前改编之基线法。', 'ru': 'Обработка естественного языка для видео на языке жестов - включая такие задачи, как распознавание, перевод и поиск - имеет решающее значение для того, чтобы сделать технологии искусственного интеллекта доступными для глухих людей, и в последние годы набирает интерес к исследованиям.  В данной работе мы рассмотрим проблему поиска ключевых слов или ключевых фраз в видеороликах на языке жестов.  Это важная задача, поскольку значительный контент на языке жестов часто передается с помощью пальцев, и, насколько нам известно, эта задача ранее не изучалась.  Мы предлагаем сквозную модель для этой задачи, FSS-Net, которая совместно обнаруживает fingspelling и сопоставляет его с текстовой последовательностью. Наши эксперименты, проведенные на большом публичном наборе данных ASL fingerspelling в дикой природе, показывают важность обнаружения fingerspelling как компонента модели поиска и поиска.  Наша модель значительно превосходит базовые методы, адаптированные из предыдущей работы над связанными задачами.', 'ga': 'Tá próiseáil teanga nádúrtha le haghaidh físeán teanga comharthaíochta --- lena n-áirítear tascanna amhail aithint, aistriúchán agus cuardach --- ríthábhachtach chun rochtain a dhéanamh ar theicneolaíochtaí hintleachta saorga do dhaoine bodhra, agus tá sé ag tógáil spéise taighde le blianta beaga anuas. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le cuardach le haghaidh eochairfhocail mhéarlitrithe nó eochairfhrásaí i bhfíseáin amhtheanga chomharthaíochta. Is tasc tábhachtach é seo mar is minic a chuirtear ábhar suntasach i dteanga chomharthaíochta in iúl trí mhéarlitriú, agus go dtí ár n-eolas níl aon staidéar déanta ar an tasc seo roimhe seo. Molaimid múnla ceann go ceann don tasc seo, FSS-Net, a bhrathann litriú méar le chéile agus a mheaitseálann í le seicheamh téacs. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh, a rinneadh ar thacar sonraí poiblí mór de mhéarlitriú ASL san fhiántas, an tábhacht a bhaineann le litriú méara a bhrath mar chuid de shamhail cuardaigh agus aisghabhála. Is fearr go mór lenár múnla na modhanna bunlíne a cuireadh in oiriúint ón obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar thascanna gaolmhara.', 'hu': 'A jelnyelvi videók természetes nyelvi feldolgozása – beleértve az olyan feladatokat, mint az felismerés, a fordítás és a keresés – kulcsfontosságú ahhoz, hogy a mesterséges intelligencia technológiákat siketek számára elérhetővé tegyék, és az utóbbi években kutatási érdeklődést szerezzenek. Ebben a tanulmányban foglalkozunk az ujjbetűs kulcsszavak vagy kulcskifejezések keresésének problémájával nyers jelnyelvi videókban. Ez fontos feladat, hiszen a jelnyelv jelentős tartalmát gyakran ujjírással közvetítik, és tudomásunk szerint ezt a feladatot még nem tanulmányozták. Ehhez a feladathoz egy end-to-end modellt javasolunk, az FSS-Net-et, amely együttesen felismeri az ujjhelyesírást és egy szövegsorozathoz illeszti azt. Kísérleteink, amelyeket a vadon élő ASL ujjhelyesírás nagy nyilvános adatkészletén végeztünk, rámutatnak az ujjhelyesírás felismerésének fontosságára, mint egy keresési és visszakeresési modell összetevőjére. Modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja a kapcsolódó feladatok korábbi munkájából kiigazított alapvető módszereket.', 'el': 'Η επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας για το βίντεο νοηματικής γλώσσας -συμπεριλαμβανομένων των καθηκόντων όπως η αναγνώριση, η μετάφραση, και η αναζήτηση- είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για να καταστήσει τις τεχνολογίες τεχνητής νοημοσύνης προσβάσιμες στα κουφό άτομα, και κερδίζει ερευνητικό ενδιαφέρον τα τελευταία χρόνια. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της αναζήτησης λέξεων-κλειδιών ή λέξεων-κλειδιών σε ακατέργαστα βίντεο νοηματικής γλώσσας. Αυτό είναι ένα σημαντικό έργο, δεδομένου ότι σημαντικό περιεχόμενο στη νοηματική γλώσσα μεταδίδεται συχνά μέσω ορθογραφίας, και από όσο γνωρίζουμε το έργο δεν έχει μελετηθεί προηγουμένως. Προτείνουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο για αυτό το έργο, το οποίο από κοινού ανιχνεύει την ορθογραφία και την αντιστοιχίζει σε μια ακολουθία κειμένου. Τα πειράματά μας, που πραγματοποιήθηκαν σε ένα μεγάλο δημόσιο σύνολο δεδομένων της ορθογραφίας στην άγρια φύση, δείχνουν τη σημασία της ανίχνευσης ορθογραφίας ως συστατικό ενός μοντέλου αναζήτησης και ανάκτησης. Το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις μεθόδους βάσης προσαρμοσμένες από προηγούμενες εργασίες σε σχετικές εργασίες.', 'it': "L'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale per i video del linguaggio dei segni --- inclusi compiti come riconoscimento, traduzione e ricerca --- è cruciale per rendere le tecnologie di intelligenza artificiale accessibili alle persone sorde e sta guadagnando interesse nella ricerca negli ultimi anni. In questo articolo, affrontiamo il problema della ricerca di parole chiave digitate o frasi chiave nei video grezzi della lingua dei segni. Si tratta di un compito importante in quanto contenuti significativi nel linguaggio dei segni sono spesso trasmessi attraverso l'ortografia digitale e per quanto ci risulta il compito non è stato studiato prima. Per questo compito proponiamo un modello end-to-end, FSS-Net, che rileva congiuntamente l'ortografia delle dita e lo abbina a una sequenza di testo. I nostri esperimenti, condotti su un ampio set di dati pubblici di fingerspelling ASL in natura, mostrano l'importanza del rilevamento fingerspelling come componente di un modello di ricerca e recupero. Il nostro modello supera significativamente i metodi di base adattati dal lavoro precedente su attività correlate.", 'kk': 'Қолтаңбалау тілдері үшін таңбалау тілдері--- тапсырмалар, аудару және іздеу сияқты--- құшқы адамдарға мүмкіндік беру үшін әртүрлі интеллектер технологияларын жасау үшін маңызды, және соңғы жылдар Бұл қағазда, сілтемелер тіліндегі кілтті сөздерді не кілтті сөздерді іздеу мәселесін шешуге болады. Бұл маңызды тапсырма, өйткені қолтаңбалау тілдегі мазмұның көпшілігі бақылау мәліметі арқылы, біздің білімізге тапсырма алдында оқылмаған. Бұл тапсырманың соңындағы үлгісін, FSS- Net үшін біріктіріп бақылау үлгісін анықтап мәтін ретінде сәйкес келетін үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біздің тәжірибеміз, ASL бақылау мәліметтерінің үлкен деректер жиынында жасалған, іздеу мен алу үлгісінің компоненті ретінде бақылау мәліметін көрсетеді. Біздің үлгіміз негізгі жол әдістерін алдыңғы жұмыс істеген тапсырмалардан өзгертіп жатқан.', 'lt': 'Gamtinis kalbų apdorojimas ženklų kalbos vaizdo įrašams---įskaitant tokias užduotis kaip pripažinimas, vertimas ir paieška---yra labai svarbus siekiant, kad dirbtinės žvalgybos technologijos būtų prieinamos kurtiems asmenims ir pastaraisiais metais gauna mokslinių tyrimų interesus. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame problem ą, susijusią su pirštų rašytinių raktų žodžių ar raktų frazių paieška neapdorotoje ženklų kalboje vaizdo įrašuose. Tai svarbu užduotis, nes reikšmingas ženklų kalbos turinys dažnai perduodamas pirštų rašymu, o mūsų žiniomis užduotis anksčiau nebuvo tirta. Siūlome šio uždavinio FSS-Net model į, kuris kartu aptinka pirštų rašymą ir atitinka teksto seką. Mūsų eksperimentai, atlikti su dideliu viešu ASL pirštų rašymo lauke duomenų rinkiniu, rodo pirštų rašymo nustatymo svarbą kaip paieškos ir paieškos modelio komponentą. Mūsų modelis gerokai viršija pradinius metodus, pritaikytus atlikus ankstesnį darbą atliekant susijusias užduotis.', 'mk': 'Природното обработување на јазикот за видео на знаковиот јазик -- вклучувајќи ги и задачите како признавање, превод и пребарување -- е клучно за направата на вештачката интелигенциска технологија достапна за глувите поединци и добива интерес за истражување во последните години Во овој весник, ние го решаваме проблемот со пребарувањето на клучни зборови со писмо на прсти или клучни фрази во видеата на сиров јазик на знаци. Ова е важна задача бидејќи значителната содржина на јазикот на знаците честопати се пренесува преку пишување на прстите и за наше знаење задачата не е проучена порано. Предложуваме модел од крај до крај за оваа задача, FSS- Net, кој заедно детектира правопис на прстите и го совпаѓа со текстова секвенца. Нашите експерименти, направени на големи јавни податоци за правопис на прстите во дивината, покажуваат важност на детекција на правопис на прстите како компонент на модел на пребарување и преземање. Нашиот модел значително ги надминува основните методи адаптирани од претходната работа на поврзаните задачи.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების პროცესი სიტყვებისთვის ვიდეოში---საკუთარი დავამცემულება, განაცემულება და ძიება---მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ აკეთეფიკალური ინტელექციის ტექნოლოგიების შესაძლებლობა ძლიერი ინტელ ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ დავწეროთ პრობლემა, რომელიც წერტილის წერტილის სიტყვის ან გასაღების სიტყვის ვიდეოში. ეს არის მნიშვნელოვანი რაოდენობა, რადგან მნიშვნელოვანი შესახებ წერტილის შესახებ წერტილის გამოყენება, და ჩვენი უცნობისთვის, რაოდენობა არ უკვე იყოს. ჩვენ მინდომა ამ დავალებისთვის დასრულებული მოდელი, FSS-Net, რომელიც ერთად აღმოჩნდება წერტილის წერტილის წერტილება და მისი ტექსტის წერტილის წერტილებას. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც აღმოჩენა დიდი საზოგადო მონაცემების შესახებ ASL პროგრამების მარტილის შესახებ, გაჩვენება პროგრამების გასანიშვნელობა როგორც შეძლება და მო ჩვენი მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანია უფრო მეტი, რომელიც წინასწორედ მუშაობით დაკავშირებული დავალებების შესახებ.', 'ms': 'Pemprosesan bahasa alami untuk video bahasa isyarat---termasuk tugas seperti pengenalan, terjemahan, dan carian---adalah penting untuk membuat teknologi kecerdasan buatan boleh diakses kepada individu pekak, dan mendapatkan minat penyelidikan dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah mencari kata kunci ejaan jari atau frasa kunci dalam video bahasa isyarat mentah. Ini adalah tugas penting kerana kandungan yang signifikan dalam bahasa tanda sering dihantar melalui ejaan jari, dan kepada pengetahuan kami tugas ini belum pernah dipelajari sebelumnya. Kami cadangkan model akhir-akhir untuk tugas ini, FSS-Net, yang bersama-sama mengesan ejaan jari dan padan dengan urutan teks. Eksperimen kami, dilakukan pada set data awam besar penyejaan jari ASL di alam liar, menunjukkan pentingnya pengesan penyejaan jari sebagai komponen model pencarian dan pemulihan. Our model significantly outperforms baseline methods adapted from prior work on related tasks.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ വീഡിയോയില്\u200d ഒപ്പിടുന്നതിനായി സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയസ്ത്രീയം ചെയ്യുന്നത്, തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും പോലുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d-- ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വിരല്\u200d അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട കീ വാക്കുകള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കീ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ശേഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ് ഇതൊരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ് ചിഹ്നത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷയിലെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഉള്ളടക്കം എപ്പോഴും വിരല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുഖേന ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റെ അവസാനത്തേക്കുള്ള അവസാന മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദാനം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ഒരുമിച്ച് വിരല്\u200d അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയത്തെ കണ്ടെത്ത ഞങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d മരുഭൂമിയിലെ വലിയ പൊതു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു തെരച്ചിലും പിന്തിരിച്ചുകൊണ്ടും മോഡ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d രീതികളില്\u200d നിന്നും മുമ്പ് ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ച', 'mt': "L-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwa għall-vidjo tal-lingwa tas-sinjali---inkluż kompiti bħar-rikonoxximent, it-traduzzjoni, u t-tiftix---huwa kruċjali biex it-teknoloġiji tal-intelliġenza artifiċjali jsiru aċċessibbli għal individwi sordi, u qed jikseb interess fir-riċerka f'dawn l-aħħar snin. F’din id-dokument, nindirizzaw il-problema tat-tiftix għal kliem ewlieni miktub bl-ortografija tas-swaba’ jew frażijiet ewlenija f’vidjows tal-lingwa tas-sinjali mhux ipproċessata. Dan huwa kompitu importanti peress li kontenut sinifikanti fil-lingwa tas-sinjali ta’ spiss jitwassal permezz tal-ortografija tas-swaba’, u għall-għarfien tagħna l-kompitu ma ġiex studjat qabel. Aħna nipproponu mudell minn tarf sa tarf għal dan il-kompitu, FSS-Net, li b’mod konġunt jidentifika l-ortografija tas-swaba’ u jaqbel ma’ sekwenza tat-test. L-esperimenti tagħna, magħmula fuq sett pubbliku kbir ta’ dejta dwar l-ortografija tas-swaba’ ASL fl-ambjent selvaġġ, juru l-importanza tal-identifikazzjoni tal-ortografija tas-swaba’ bħala komponent ta’ mudell ta’ tiftix u rkupru. Il-mudell tagħna jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-metodi ta’ bażi adattati minn xogħol preċedenti fuq kompiti relatati.", 'mn': 'Тэмдэглэгдсэн хэл бичлэгийн байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл---ойлголт, хөрөнгө оруулалт, хайлт гэх мэт үйл ажиллагаанууд---хүүхдүүд дүүргүй хүмүүст уран бүтээлч ухаан технологийг ашиглах нь чухал, сүүлийн жилүүд судал Энэ цаасан дээр бид хуруу бичлэгийн түлхүүр үг эсвэл түлхүүр үг бичлэгүүдийн хайх асуудлыг харуулж байна. Энэ бол хамгийн чухал үйл ажиллагаа, учир нь тэмдэглэгдсэн хэл дээр маш чухал тохиолдол ихэвчлэн хуруу бичилгээгээр илгээгддэг. Бидний мэдэхэд энэ үйл ажиллагааг өмнө судалгаагүй. Бид энэ ажлын төгсгөл-төгсгөл загвар, FSS-Net, хуруу бичлэгийг хамтдаа олж, текст дарааллаар холбогддог. Бидний туршилт, олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээр хийсэн ASL хуруу шинжлэх хэлбэрээр, хуруу шинжлэх ухааны чухал зүйлийг хайж, авах загварын нэг хэсэг болгон харуулдаг. Бидний загвар нь өмнө ажил дээр холбоотой ажил дээр зохицуулагдсан суурь шугам арга загвараас илүү чухал үр дүнтэй.', 'no': 'Naturlig språk-prosessering for signeringsspråk-video---inkluderer oppgåver som gjenkjenning, omsetjing og søk---er viktig for å gjera kunstiske intelligentsteknologiar tilgjengelege til døve personer, og får forskningsinteresse i siste år. I denne papiret vert vi oppretta problemet med å søkja etter fingerstava nøkkelord eller nøkkelfrasar i råsignspråk-videoar. Dette er ein viktig oppgåve sidan det er viktige innhaldet i signeringsspråk ofte konvertert gjennom fingerstaving, og til vårt kjenning er oppgåva ikkje studiert før. Vi foreslår ein sluttmodell for denne oppgåva, FSS- Net, som finn fingerstaving og passar med ei tekstsekvens. Eksperimentane våre, utførte på ein stor offentleg dataset med ASL- staving i det ølte, viser viktigheten til å finna fingerstaving som komponent av ein søkjemodell og henta ut. Modellen vårt utfører vanleg baseline-metodar tilpassa frå førre arbeid på relaterte oppgåver.', 'pl': 'Przetwarzanie języka naturalnego dla wideo w języku migowym – w tym zadań takich jak rozpoznawanie, tłumaczenie i wyszukiwanie – ma kluczowe znaczenie dla udostępniania technologii sztucznej inteligencji osobom niesłyszącym i zyskuje zainteresowanie badawcze w ostatnich latach. W niniejszym artykule poruszamy problem wyszukiwania słów kluczowych z pisownią palcem lub fraz kluczowych w surowych filmach z języka migowego. Jest to ważne zadanie, ponieważ znaczące treści w języku migowym są często przekazywane za pomocą pisowni finger-spelling, a z naszej wiedzy zadanie to nie było wcześniej badane. Proponujemy kompleksowy model dla tego zadania, FSS-Net, który wspólnie wykrywa pisownię palców i dopasowuje ją do sekwencji tekstowej. Nasze eksperymenty, przeprowadzone na dużym publicznym zbiorze danych dotyczących pisowni ASL na wolności, pokazują znaczenie wykrywania pisowni jako komponentu modelu wyszukiwania i odzyskiwania. Nasz model znacznie przewyższa metody bazowe dostosowane do wcześniejszych prac nad powiązanymi z nimi zadaniami.', 'ro': 'Procesarea limbajului natural pentru video în limbajul semnelor --- inclusiv sarcini precum recunoașterea, traducerea și căutarea --- este esențială pentru a face tehnologiile inteligenței artificiale accesibile persoanelor surde și câștigă interes de cercetare în ultimii ani. În această lucrare, abordăm problema căutării cuvintelor cheie scrise cu degetul sau a frazelor cheie în videoclipurile cu limbajul semnelor brut. Aceasta este o sarcină importantă deoarece conținutul semnificativ în limbajul semnelor este adesea transmis prin ortografie, iar din cunoștințele noastre sarcina nu a fost studiată înainte. Propunem un model end-to-end pentru această sarcină, FSS-Net, care detectează împreună ortografia degetelor și o potrivește cu o secvență de text. Experimentele noastre, efectuate pe un set larg de date publice de ortografie ASL în sălbăticie, arată importanța detectării ortografiei ca o componentă a unui model de căutare și recuperare. Modelul nostru depășește semnificativ metodele de bază adaptate din lucrările anterioare cu privire la sarcinile conexe.', 'sr': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika za video znakova -- uključujući zadatke poput priznanja, prevoda i pretraživanja -- je ključno za postizanje umjetne inteligentne tehnologije dostupne gluvim pojedincima, a u poslednjih godina dobija interes istraživanja. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem traženja ključnih reči ili ključnih rečenica u snimkama sirovog znaka. Ovo je važan zadatak pošto se značajni sadržaj jezika znakova često prenosi putem pisanja prstiju, a na naše znanje zadatak nije ranije proučen. Predlažemo model kraja do kraja za ovaj zadatak, FSS-Net, koji zajedno otkriva pištolj prstiju i odgovara sa tekstom sekvencijom. Naši eksperimenti, napravljeni na velikom javnom setu podataka pisma ASL prstiju u divljini, pokazuju važnost otkrivanja pisma prstiju kao komponent pretraživanja i uzbune model a. Naš model značajno iznosi početne metode prilagođene od ranog rada na povezanim zadacima.', 'si': 'සායින් භාෂාව වීඩියෝ සඳහා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය කරන්න--- අනුක්\u200dරියාත්මක, පරිවාදය, සහ හ හොයාගන්න වගේ වැඩක් සඳහා විශ මේ පැත්තට, අපි ඇඟිලි වචන සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. මේක වැදගත් වැඩක් වෙන්නේ සලකුණු භාෂාවේ වැදගත් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ භාෂාවේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්න අපි මේ වැඩ සඳහා අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, FSS-Net, ඒක සම්බන්ධයෙන් අංගුරු වර අපේ පරීක්ෂණය, ASL ඇඟුල් වර්ණයේ ලොකු සාමාජික දත්ත සූදානයට කරලා තියෙන්නේ, සොයාගෙන හා ආරක්ෂා මොඩල් එකක් වගේ අඟුල් වර අපේ මොඩල් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා මුලින් ව්\u200dයාපෘතියෙන් සම්බන්ධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතිය', 'so': "Baaraandegista luqada asalka ah ee fiidiyowga saxafka luqada---waa muhiim in loo sameeyo teknolojiyo aqoonsiga, turjumidda iyo raadinta- in loo helo qofka dhega la'aa, waxna uu faa'iidada waxbarashada ugu dambeeyay. Warqaddan waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa dhibaatada raadinta hadallada afka lagu qoray ama hadallada furan ee ku qoran fiidiyowyada afka saxafka. Tani waa shaqo muhiim ah, sababtoo ah waxyaabo muhiim ah oo luqada saxafka waxaa inta badan lagu qabanqaabiyaa ku saabsan hadalka farqada iyo aqoontayada aan horay loo baran karin shaqada. Tusaale dhammaadka ugu dhammaadka shaqadaas, FSS-Net, kaas oo si wadajir ah u fiiriyaa fasaxa farcanka oo u eg qoraalka. Imtixaankayada, ee lagu sameeyay sawirada dadweynaha ee ASL oo ku sawiraya dugaagga, wuxuu tusaa muhiimka raadinta farniinka iyo dib-u-qaadashada. Our model significantly outperforms baseline methods adapted from prior work on related tasks.", 'sv': 'Naturligt språkbearbetning för teckenspråksvideo --- inklusive uppgifter som erkännande, översättning och sökning --- är avgörande för att göra artificiell intelligens teknik tillgänglig för döva individer, och har fått forskningsintresse de senaste åren. I denna uppsats tar vi upp problemet med att söka efter fingerstavade nyckelord eller nyckelfraser i obehandlade teckenspråksvideor. Detta är en viktig uppgift eftersom betydande innehåll i teckenspråk ofta förmedlas via fingerstavning, och enligt vår kunskap har uppgiften inte studerats tidigare. Vi föreslår en end-to-end modell för denna uppgift, FSS-Net, som gemensamt identifierar fingerstavning och matchar den till en textsekvens. Våra experiment, gjorda på en stor publik datauppsättning av ASL fingerstavning i naturen, visar vikten av fingerstavning detektering som en komponent i en sökning och hämtning modell. Vår modell överträffar avsevärt baslinjemetoder anpassade från tidigare arbete med relaterade uppgifter.', 'ta': 'சாதாரண மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் குறியீட்டு வீடியோவுக்கு - அடையாளம், மொழிபெயர்ப்பு, மற்றும் தேடுதல் போன்ற செயல்களுக்கு சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது - செவிடர்களான ப இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் விரல் சொல்லப்பட்ட விசைச்சொற்கள் அல்லது விசைச்சொற்றொடர்களை குறையீடியோவில் தேடும் ப இது ஒரு முக்கியமான செயல் இந்த பணிக்கான முடிவு முடிவு மாதிரியை நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், FSS- Net, அது ஒன்றாக க விரல் சொல்லுதலை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் மற்ற எங்கள் சோதனைகள், ASL விரல் சொல்லும் பெரிய பொது தகவல் அமைப்பில் செய்யப்பட்டது, காட்டில் சொல்லும் விரல் சொல்லும் கண்டுபிடிப்பது முக் எங்கள் மாதிரி முறையாக தொடர்புடைய பணிகளில் முன்னால் ஏற்றுமதி செய்யப்பட்ட அடிப்படையாளர் முறைமைகளை முறைய', 'ur': 'سائن زبان ویڈیو کے لئے طبیعی زبان کی پردازی---اس میں پہچان، ترجمہ، اور جہاد کے مطابق دنیا کی شامل ہے---بہرے شخصوں کے لئے بہرے بہرے تکنولوژی کے لئے دسترسی حاصل کرنے کے لئے بہت اہم ہے اور اگلے سالوں میں تحقیقات کا علاق اس کاغذ میں، ہم انگلیسی کلیدوں یا کلیدیوں کی تلاش کے مسئلہ میں مشکل کریں گے۔ یہ ایک اہم کام ہے اس وجہ سے کہ نشانیوں کی زبان میں اہم موجود موجود موجود انگلیاں کے ذریعہ سے پیدا ہوتا ہے اور ہمارے علم میں یہ کام پہلے نہیں پڑھا گیا ہے۔ ہم نے اس کام کے لئے آخر-to-end موڈل کا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، FSS-Net، جو ایک ساتھ انگلیسی سپکٹ کی تلاش کرتا ہے اور اس کے ساتھ ایک متن سپکٹ کے ساتھ ملتا ہے. ہماری آزمائش، ایک بڑی عمومی ڈاٹ سٹ پر جو ASL انگلیسی سپٹ میں کیا گیا ہے، انگلیسی سپٹ شناسایی کا اہم دکھاتا ہے ایک جگہ اور پھیر لینے موڈل کی ایک komponent۔ ہمارا موڈل معلوم ہوتا ہے کہ اس سے پہلے کام کے بارے میں اضافہ کیے گئے بنیس لین طریقے سے اضافہ کیے جاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Imzo vidviy va tarjima va qidirish kabi vazifalar uchun tabiiy tilni boshqarish muhim, va eng yil ichida qo'llangan odamlarga bog'liq intellektuvlar teknologiyani qo'shish uchun juda muhim. va yaqinda o'rganishni qiziqarish qiziqaratiga ega bo'ladi. Ushbu qogʻozda, biz yozilgan tugmalar yoki kalit soʻzlarini qidirish uchun muammolani boshqaramiz. This is an important task since significant content in sign language is often conveyed via fingerspelling, and to our knowledge the task has not been studied before.   Biz shu vazifa uchun oxirigi modeli, FSS-Net, birlashtirilgan barmoq imkoniyatini ko'rsatadi va uni matn chegaraga moslash mumkin. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz, balki ASL barmoqlarining katta umumiy maʼlumotlar tarkibida bajarildi, barmoqning imkoniyatlarini qidirish va qaytarish modelining muhimligini ko'rsatish. Bizning modelimizda muhim bog'liq vazifalar bilan birinchi ishdan o'zgartirilgan baseline usullarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho video ngôn ngữ ký tự bao gồm các nhiệm vụ như nhận biết, dịch, và tìm kiếm... là điều cốt yếu cho việc làm các công nghệ trí tuệ nhân tạo có thể tiếp cận được người điếc, và đang thu hút nghiên cứu trong những năm gần đây. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề tìm kiếm từ khóa đọc được dấu tay hoặc các cụm từ khoá trong đoạn video ngôn ngữ chữ ký thô. Đây là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng vì nội dung quan trọng trong ngôn ngữ ký hiệu thường được phát tán bằng dấu vân tay, và theo chúng tôi biết nhiệm vụ chưa được nghiên cứu trước đây. Chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình cuối cho nhiệm vụ này, FSB-net, đồng thời phát hiện dấu vân tay và kết hợp nó với một chuỗi chữ. Các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi, được thực hiện trên một bộ dữ liệu lớn của các mô tả ngón tay ASL trong tự nhiên, cho thấy tầm quan trọng của việc phát hiện dấu vân tay như một thành phần của mô hình tìm kiếm và lấy cắp. Cách của chúng tôi hoàn thiện các phương pháp cơ bản thích nghi từ việc làm trước với các công việc liên quan.', 'bg': 'Обработката на естествения език за видео на жестовия език - включително задачи като разпознаване, превод и търсене - е от решаващо значение за превръщането на технологиите за изкуствен интелект в достъпни за глухи хора и набира изследователски интерес през последните години. В тази статия разглеждаме проблема с търсенето на ключови думи или ключови фрази в сурови клипове на жестов език. Това е важна задача, тъй като значителното съдържание на жестовия език често се предава чрез правописа с пръсти и до наше знание задачата не е изучавана преди. Предлагаме модел от край до край за тази задача, който съвместно открива правописа и го съчетава с текстова последователност. Нашите експерименти, направени върху голям публичен набор от данни за правописа в природата, показват значението на откриването на правописа като компонент на модела за търсене и извличане. Нашият модел значително превъзхожда базовите методи, адаптирани от предишна работа по свързани задачи.', 'da': 'Naturlig sprogbehandling til tegnsprogsvideo --- herunder opgaver som anerkendelse, oversættelse og søgning --- er afgørende for at gøre kunstig intelligens teknologier tilgængelige for døve individer, og er ved at vinde forskningsinteresse i de seneste år. I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med at søge efter fingerstavede søgeord eller nøglesætninger i rå tegnsprogsvideoer. Dette er en vigtig opgave, da betydeligt indhold i tegnsprog ofte formidles via fingerstavning, og vi ved, at opgaven ikke er blevet undersøgt før. Vi foreslår en end-to-end model til denne opgave, FSS-Net, der i fællesskab registrerer fingerstavning og matcher den til en tekstsekvens. Vores eksperimenter, udført på et stort offentligt datasæt af ASL fingerstavning i naturen, viser vigtigheden af fingerstavning detektering som en komponent i en søgning og hentning model. Vores model overgår væsentligt baseline metoder tilpasset fra tidligere arbejde på relaterede opgaver.', 'nl': "Natuurlijke taalverwerking voor gebarentaalvideo-inclusief taken als herkenning, vertaling en zoeken-is cruciaal voor het toegankelijk maken van kunstmatige intelligentietechnologieën voor doven, en wint de laatste jaren onderzoeksinteresse. In dit artikel behandelen we het probleem van het zoeken naar vingergespelde trefwoorden of sleutelzinnen in ruwe gebarentaal video's. Dit is een belangrijke taak omdat belangrijke inhoud in gebarentaal vaak via vingerspelling wordt overgebracht, en voor zover wij weten is deze taak nog niet eerder bestudeerd. Voor deze taak stellen we een end-to-end model voor, FSS-Net, dat gezamenlijk vingerspelling detecteert en matcht met een tekstreeks. Onze experimenten, uitgevoerd op een grote publieke dataset van ASL vingerspelling in het wild, tonen het belang van vingerspelling detectie als onderdeel van een zoek- en terugwinningsmodel. Ons model presteert aanzienlijk beter dan baseline methoden die zijn aangepast aan eerdere werkzaamheden aan gerelateerde taken.", 'hr': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika za video znakova -- uključujući zadatke poput priznanja, prevoda i pretraživanja -- ključno je za postizanje umjetničkih inteligencijskih tehnologija dostupnih gluvim osobama i dobivanje interesa istraživanja u posljednjih godina. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem traženja ključnih riječi ili ključnih rečenica u snimkama sirovog znaka. To je važan zadatak jer se značajni sadržaj jezika znakova često prenosi putem pisanja prstiju, a na naše znanje zadatak prije nije proučen. Predlažemo model kraja do kraja za ovaj zadatak, FSS-Net, koji zajedno otkriva pismo prstiju i odgovara s tekstom sekvenciji. Naši eksperimenti, učinjeni na velikoj javnoj seti podataka pisma ASL prstiju u divljini, pokazuju važnost otkrivanja pisma prstiju kao komponent model a pretraživanja i povratka. Naš model značajno iznosi početne metode prilagođene iz prethodnog rada na povezanim zadacima.', 'de': 'Die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache für Gebärdensprachevideos – einschließlich Aufgaben wie Erkennung, Übersetzung und Suche – ist entscheidend, um Technologien der künstlichen Intelligenz Gehörlosen zugänglich zu machen und gewinnt in den letzten Jahren an Forschungsinteresse. In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir das Problem der Suche nach fingergeschriebenen Schlüsselwörtern oder Schlüsselphrasen in rohen Gebärdensprachevideos. Dies ist eine wichtige Aufgabe, da wichtige Inhalte in der Gebärdensprache oft über Fingerspelling vermittelt werden und die Aufgabe unseres Wissens bisher noch nicht studiert wurde. Für diese Aufgabe schlagen wir ein End-to-End-Modell vor, FSS-Net, das gemeinsam Fingerspelling erkennt und einer Textsequenz zuordnet. Unsere Experimente, die an einem großen öffentlichen Datensatz von ASL-Fingerspelling in freier Wildbahn durchgeführt wurden, zeigen die Bedeutung der Fingerspelling-Erkennung als Bestandteil eines Such- und Retrieval-Modells. Unser Modell übertrifft deutlich Basismethoden, die von früheren Arbeiten an verwandten Aufgaben angepasst wurden.', 'id': 'Proses bahasa alami untuk video bahasa tanda---termasuk tugas seperti pengenalan, terjemahan, dan pencarian---adalah penting untuk membuat teknologi kecerdasan buatan tersedia untuk individu tuli, dan mendapatkan minat penelitian dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah mencari kata kunci yang disemak jari atau frasa kunci dalam video bahasa tanda mentah. Ini adalah tugas penting karena konten yang signifikan dalam bahasa tanda sering dihantar melalui ejaan jari, dan untuk pengetahuan kita tugas belum pernah dipelajari sebelumnya. We propose an end-to-end model for this task, FSS-Net, that jointly detects fingerspelling and matches it to a text sequence.  Eksperimen kami, dilakukan pada set data publik besar dari penyejaan jari ASL di alam liar, menunjukkan pentingnya deteksi penyejaan jari sebagai komponen dari model pencarian dan penemuan. Model kita jauh melebihi metode dasar yang diadaptasi dari pekerjaan sebelumnya pada tugas berkaitan.', 'ko': '수화 영상의 자연 언어 처리인 식별, 번역, 검색 등 임무는 귀머거리들이 인공지능 기술을 사용할 수 있도록 하는 데 매우 중요하다. 최근 몇 년 동안 이 분야의 연구는 날로 주목을 받고 있다.본고에서 우리는 원시 수화 영상에서 손가락 맞춤법의 키워드나 관건적인 단어를 검색하는 문제를 해결했다.이것은 중요한 임무이다. 왜냐하면 수화의 중요한 내용은 보통 손가락 맞춤법을 통해 전달되기 때문이다. 우리가 아는 바에 의하면 이 임무는 이전에 연구된 적이 없다고 한다.우리는 이 작업을 위해 손가락 맞춤법을 검사하고 텍스트 서열과 일치하는 끝에서 끝까지의 모델 FSS-Net을 제시했다.우리의 실험은 야외의 대형 ASL fingerspelling 공공 데이터 집합에서 진행된 것으로fingerspelling 검측이 검색과 검색 모델의 한 구성 부분으로서의 중요성을 나타냈다.우리의 모델은 이전의 관련 임무의 기선 방법보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'fa': 'پرداخت زبان طبیعی برای ویدئو زبان نشانی---شامل کارهای مثل شناختن، ترجمه و جستجو---برای ساختن تکنولوژی های اطلاعات مصنوعی دسترسی برای افراد کره مهم است و در سالهای اخیر علاقه تحقیقات را دریافت می کند. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل جستجوی کلمات نوشته شده انگشت یا کلمات کلید در ویدئو های زبان نوشته\u200cای را حل می\u200cکنیم. این کار مهم است از آنجا که محتوای مهم در زبان نشانه اغلب با نوشتن انگشتی به وسیله نوشتن انگشتی منتقل می شود، و به دانش ما این کار قبلاً مطالعه نشده است. ما یک مدل آخر و پایان برای این کار، FSS-Net را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با همدیگر نوشته\u200cهای انگشت را شناسایی می\u200cکند و با یک رده\u200cی متن هماهنگ می\u200cکند. آزمایش\u200cهای ما، روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای عمومی از نوشته\u200cهای انگشت ASL در جنگل انجام شده، اهمیت شناسایی نوشته\u200cهای انگشت را به عنوان بخش یک مدل جستجو و بازیابی نشان می\u200cدهد. مدل ما خیلی زیادی از روش\u200cهای پایین\u200cشناسی که از کارهای قبلی روی کار\u200cهای مربوط به تغییر داده شده\u200cاند انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa lugha za asili kwa ajili ya video za lugha za saini --- ikiwa ni pamoja na kazi kama kutambua, tafsiri na kutafuta --- ni muhimu kwa kutengeneza teknolojia za akili za kisasa zinazopatikana kwa viziwi, na inapata maslahi ya utafiti katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. ... Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia tatizo la kutafuta maneno ya ufunguo au maneno ya ufunguo katika video za lugha mbaya za saini. . ) Hii ni jukumu muhimu kwani maudhui makubwa katika lugha ya saini mara nyingi yanafanywa kwa kutumia maneno ya vidole, na kwa ufahamu wetu, kazi hiyo haijasomwa kabla. . ... Tunazipendekeza mtindo wa mwisho wa kazi hii, FSS-Net, ambao kwa pamoja hugundua maneno ya vidole na kuilinganisha na mfululizo wa maandishi. Majaribio yetu, yaliyofanyika kwenye seti kubwa ya taarifa za umma za vidole vya ASL zinazoelezea jangwa, zinaonyesha umuhimu wa kuchunguza vidole vyetu kama sehemu ya mifano ya kutafuta na kurudisha vidole. ) Mfano wetu unafanya mbinu za msingi zilizobadilishwa kutoka kabla ya kazi za kazi zinazohusiana.', 'sq': 'Procesimi natyror i gjuhës për videon e gjuhës së shenjave -- duke përfshirë detyra si njohje, përkthime dhe kërkim -- është vendimtar për të bërë teknologjitë artificiale të inteligjencës të pranueshme për individët e shurdhër dhe po fiton interes kërkimor në vitet e fundit. Në këtë letër, ne trajtojmë problem in e kërkimit të fjalëve kyçe të sinjalizuara me gishta ose frazëve kyçe në videot e gjuhës së sinjalit të papërpunuar. Kjo është një detyrë e rëndësishme pasi përmbajtja e rëndësishme në gjuhën e shenjave shpesh transmetohet nëpërmjet shkrimit të gishtave dhe sipas njohurisë sonë detyra nuk është studiuar më parë. Ne propozojmë një model nga fundi në fund për këtë detyrë, FSS-Net, që zbulon së bashku shkrimin e gishtave dhe përputhet me një sekuencë teksti. Eksperimentet tona, të bërë në një grup të madh të dhënash publike të sinjalizimit të gishtave ASL në të egër, tregojnë rëndësinë e zbulimit të sinjalizimit të gishtave si një komponent të një modeli kërkimi dhe marrje. Modeli ynë mbivlerëson ndjeshëm metodat bazë të përshtatura nga puna e mëparshme mbi detyrat e lidhura.', 'af': "Natuurlike taal-verwerking vir teken taal-video---insluitend opdragte soos herken, vertaling en soek---is daardie betaling vir kunstensielike inteligensie-teknologies toegang tot doof individuele, en is verkry van resekingbelang in onlangse jaar. In hierdie papier, adres ons die probleem om te soek vir vinger gespelde sleutelwoorde of sleutelfrase in rooi teken taal videos. Hierdie is 'n belangrike taak omdat die belangrike inhoud in teken taal dikwels deur vingerafspeling verskuif word, en aan ons kennis is die taak nie voordat onderwerp word nie. Ons voorstel 'n end- to- end model vir hierdie taak, FSS- Net, wat saamstig vinderspeling ontdek en ooreenstem dit na 'n teks volgorde. Ons eksperimente, gedoen op 'n groot publieke datastel van ASL vingerafspeling in die wilde, wys die belangrikheid van vingerafspeling beskrywing as 'n komponent van 'n soektog en herhaal model. Ons model uitvoer betekeurig baselyn metodes wat van vooraf werk op verwante taak aanpas het.", 'am': 'የአዳባዊ ቋንቋ የቋንቋ ቪዲዮ - ማስታወሻ፣ ትርጓሜ፣ እና መረጃ - ስራዎችን ለመገኘት የፍጥረት ማስታወቂያ ቴክኖሎጂ ለደንቆሮዎች ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፣ ባለፈው ዓመታት ላይ ትምህርት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ፣ የጣቢያ ቃላትን ወይም የቁልፍ ቃላትን በመፈለግ ላይ እናስረዳለን፡፡ ይህ የፊደል ቋንቋ አካባቢ ስራ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ FSS-Net የፊደል መጨረሻ ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የምድረ በዳ የASL ጣቶች መጻሕፍት በሚያሳየው ትልቅ የህዝብ ዳታ ማዕከል ላይ የተደረገውን፣ የጣቶቹን የቃላት አነፃ ማረጋገጫ እንደ ፈተና እና የመመለስ ሞዴል መሆኑን ማሳየቱ፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን አስቀድሞ በተገኘው ስራ ላይ የሚደረገውን የbaseline ሥርዓት ያሳርፋል፡፡', 'tr': 'Tebiýal diller wideoda işaretlenmek üçin---tanyş, terjime we gözlemek ýaly zadlary hem---Sur adamlara elýeterli ukyp teknolojileri bolmak üçin möhüm. Bu kagyzda biz barlamak sözleri ýa-da syz sözleri ýa-da aç sözleri wideoda çykýarys. Bu möhüm zadyr, işgal dilindeki möhüm maksady köplenç barmak ymlasy bilen söndürilýär we biziň bilgimize bu işiň öň öňki bilmedik. Biz bu täblisaň FSS-Net üçin soňky üçin bir nusga teklip edip, barmak ymlasyny bir hat sıralamaga eşleýäris. Biziň deneylerimiz, beýik ASL barmagyň ymlasynyň uly bir sahypada edildi, barmagyň ymlasyny gözlemek we gaýd etmek üçin örän möhümdigini görkez. Biziň nusgymyz öňki işden geçen täzeliklerde üýtgedilen esasy çyzgylyk ýok.', 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի վերլուծությունը նշանակալի լեզվի տեսահոլովակի համար, ներառյալ այնպիսի խնդիրներ, ինչպիսիք են ճանաչելը, թարգմանությունը և որոնումը, կարևոր է արհեստական ինտելեկտուալ տեխնոլոգիաների հասանելիության դարձնելու համար խուլ անհատնե In this paper, we address the problem of searching for fingerspelled keywords or key phrases in raw sign language videos.   Սա կարևոր խնդիր է, քանի որ ազդանշանների լեզում նշանակալի պարունակությունը հաճախ փոխանցվում է մատների գրավորումների միջոցով, և մեր գիտելիքների համար առաջին խնդիրը չի ուսումնասիրել: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի վերջ-վերջ մոդել այս խնդրի համար, ՖՍՍ-Net, որը միասին հայտնաբերում է մատների գրավորումը և համապատասխանում է այն տեքստի հաջորդականությանը: Our experiments, done on a large public dataset of ASL fingerspelling in the wild, show the importance of fingerspelling detection as a component of a search and retrieval model.   Մեր մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է հիմնական մեթոդները, որոնք հարաբերված են նախորդ աշխատանքից կապված խնդիրների վրա:', 'az': 'İşaret dili video üçün təbiətli dil işləməsi---tanıma, tercümə və arama kimi işlər də dahil edilir---sağır kişilərə müvəffəq intelleksi teknolojiləri yaratmaq və son illərdə araştırma interesini artırmaq üçün çox vacib. Bu kağızda, barmaq imzalanmış anahtar sözlərini ya da anahtar sözlərini çətin dil videolarında gözləmə problemini çəkirik. Bu möhüm bir işdir, çünki işarə dilində möhüm məlumat çox zaman parmaq imzalaması vasitəsilə təşkil edilir və bizim biliyimizə bu işin əvvəl təşkil edilməmişdir. Biz bu işin son-to-end modelini, FSS-Net üçün təklif edirik ki, bu işin barmaq imzalamasını birlikdə tanıyır və mətn seçməsinə uyuşar. Bizim təcrübələrimiz, vahşi ASL barmaq imzalamasının böyük nümunədə yapılmış, barmaq imzalamasının çoxluğunu arama və alma model in in komponenti olaraq göstərir. Bizim modellərimiz əvvəlki işlərdən uyğunlaşdırılmış əsas çətinliklərdən daha çox üstün gəlir.', 'bs': 'Prirodno obrađivanje jezika za video znakova -- uključujući zadatke poput priznanja, prevoda i pretraživanja -- ključno je za činjenje umjetničkih inteligencijskih tehnologija dostupnim gluvim pojedincima, a u posljednjih godina dobija interes istraživanja. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem traženja ključnih riječi ili ključnih fraza u snimkama sirovog znaka. To je važan zadatak jer se značajni sadržaj jezika znakova često prenosi putem pisanja prstiju, a na naše znanje zadatak prije nije proučen. Predlažemo model kraja do kraja za ovaj zadatak, FSS-Net, koji zajedno otkriva pismo prstiju i odgovara s tekstovom sekvencijom. Naši eksperimenti, napravljeni na velikom javnom setu podataka pisma ASL prstiju u divljini, pokazuju važnost otkrivanja pisma prstiju kao komponent model a pretraživanja i povratka. Naš model značajno iznosi početne metode prilagođene iz prethodnog rada na povezanim zadacima.', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক ভিডিওতে স্বাক্ষর করার জন্য স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া- যার মধ্যে কাজ আছে স্বীকৃতি, অনুবাদ, এবং অনুসন্ধান- যেমন কাজ, কৌতুহলিক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা আঙ্গুলের বানানো কীওয়ার্ড অথবা কী বাকী ভিডিওতে অনুসন্ধানের সমস্যা নিয়ে কথা বলি। এটা একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ যেহেতু স্বাক্ষর ভাষায় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয়বস্তু প্রায়শ আঙ্গুল বানানোর মাধ্যমে প্রকাশ কর আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, এফএসএস-নেট, যা একত্রে আঙ্গুলের বানান বানানো এবং টেক্সটের সেকেন্ডের সাথে মি আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো বন্যান্ডের বিশাল পাবলিক ডাটাসেটের উপর করা হয়েছে, আঙ্গুল বানানোর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরীক্ষা দেখানো হয়েছে একটি অনুসন্ধান আমাদের মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভিত্তিক কাজের পূর্ব থেকে সংশ্লিষ্ট মাধ্যমের মাধ্যমে প্রকাশ করে।', 'cs': 'Zpracování přirozeného jazyka pro video znakového jazyka – včetně úkolů jako rozpoznávání, překlad a vyhledávání – je klíčové pro zpřístupnění technologií umělé inteligence neslyšícím osobám a v posledních letech získává výzkumný zájem. V tomto článku se zabýváme problémem vyhledávání klíčových slov nebo klíčových frází v syrových videích znakového jazyka. To je důležitý úkol, protože významný obsah ve znakovém jazyce je často předáván pomocí prstů a podle našich znalostí tento úkol nebyl dříve studován. Pro tento úkol navrhujeme komplexní model FSS-Net, který společně detekuje prsty a přiřazuje je k textové sekvenci. Naše experimenty, provedené na velkém veřejném datovém souboru ASL fingerstspelling ve volné přírodě, ukazují význam detekce fingerstspellingu jako součásti vyhledávacího a vyhledávacího modelu. Náš model výrazně překonává základní metody přizpůsobené předchozí práci na souvisejících úkolech.', 'ca': "Natural language processing for sign language video---including tasks like recognition, translation, and search---is crucial for making artificial intelligence technologies accessible to deaf individuals, and is gaining research interest in recent years.   En aquest article, ens ocupem del problema de buscar paraules clau ortografies o frases clau en vídeos de llenguatge de senyals brut. Això és una tasca important, ja que continguts significatius en el llenguatge dels senyals sovint es transmet a través de l'ortografia digital, i al nostre coneixement la tasca no s'ha estudiat abans. Proposem un model de final a final per a aquesta tasca, FSS-Net, que detecta conjuntament l'ortografia digital i la coincideix amb una seqüència de text. Els nostres experiments, fets en un gran conjunt de dades públices d'ortografia digital ASL en el salvatge, mostren la importància de la detecció d'ortografia digital com a component d'un model de cerca i recuperació. El nostre model supera significativament els mètodes de base adaptats a partir de treball anterior en tasques relacionades.", 'et': 'Viipekeelse video looduskeele töötlemine - sealhulgas sellised ülesanded nagu äratundmine, tõlkimine ja otsing - on otsustava tähtsusega tehisintellekti tehnoloogiate kättesaadavaks muutmiseks kurtidele inimestele ja on viimastel aastatel kogunud teadushuvi. Käesolevas töös käsitleme probleemi otsida sõrmeõigekirjaga märksõnu või võtmerõnu toores viipekeelsetes videotes. See on oluline ülesanne, sest märkimisväärne viipekeele sisu edastatakse sageli sõrmeõigekirja kaudu ja meie teada pole seda ülesannet varem uuritud. Pakume selle ülesande jaoks välja otsast otsani mudeli FSS-Net, mis ühiselt tuvastab sõrmeõigekirja ja sobib selle tekstijadaga. Meie eksperimendid, mis on tehtud suurel avalikul andmekogumil ASL sõrmeõigekirja kohta looduses, näitavad, kui oluline on sõrmeõigekirja tuvastamine otsingu- ja otsingumudeli osana. Meie mudel ületab oluliselt algtaseme meetodeid, mis on kohandatud varasematest töödest seotud ülesannetega.', 'fi': 'Viittomakielisten videoiden luonnollisen kielen käsittely – mukaan lukien tunnistamisen, kääntämisen ja haun kaltaiset tehtävät – on ratkaisevan tärkeää tekoälyteknologioiden saattamiseksi kuurojen henkilöiden saataville, ja se on herättänyt viime vuosina kiinnostusta tutkimukseen. Tässä artikkelissa käsittelemme ongelmaa etsiä sormenkirjoitettuja avainsanoja tai avainlauseita raakavideoista viittomakielisistä videoista. Tämä on tärkeä tehtävä, sillä viittomakielen merkittävä sisältö välitetään usein sormenkirjoituksen kautta, eikä tätä tehtävää ole tutkittu tietääksemme aikaisemmin. Ehdotamme tehtävään end-to-end-mallia, FSS-Net, joka yhdessä tunnistaa sormenkirjoituksen ja yhdistää sen tekstijärjestykseen. Kokeemme, jotka on tehty suurella julkisella ASL-sormenkirjoituksen aineistolla luonnossa, osoittavat sormenkirjoituksen tunnistamisen merkityksen osana haku- ja hakumallia. Mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi paremmin kuin aikaisemmista tehtävistä tehdyistä töistä sovitetut perusmenetelmät.', 'jv': 'Perusahaan langgar sampeyan kanggo nganggo video-sampeyan luwih ---tambah njaluk akeh njaluk awak, terjamah lan bukani ---wis klênggu nggawe teknôlogi artikse sing apik lan tambah kanggo ngelangul sampeyan surat, lan ngelangul perusahaan sampeyan mrogram. foo,bar and baz Ere sakjane seneng nggawe barang sandi, akeh nggawe aturan anyar kang sinau kanggo kelas urip bantuan ingkang, lan kanggo ngeratan awake dhewe ora bisa digawe seneng operasi ora bisa yatak. Awak dhéwé ngerbah model end-to-end kanggo nggawe task iki, WSS-net, iki dadi nambah dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo nambah mrogras Name Monday', 'ha': "Cirari da harshe na natura wa video na cikin harshe------, yana da aikin kama taniya, da fassarar, da kuma search-----, yana da muhimu ga ka sami technyokin masu dangantar da kuma masu saurãre zuwa ga mutane na saurare, kuma yana da amfani da research a shekara na farko. Daga wannan takardar, Munã shirya matsalar da za'a nemaɓa wa neman maganar maɓallun da aka yi wa fassara ko kuma da maɓalli cikin video masu yin raw. Wannan wani aikin muhimu ne da aka haɗa kayan cikin harshen Siki ko da yawa a yi tafiyar da shi a bayan fasalin na fassarar, kuma a san mu ba a karanta wannan aikin ba a gabãni. Tuna goyyar da wata motsi na ƙari zuwa-ƙari wa wannan aikin FSS-Net, wanda ke gano fassarar ɗin da ke daidaita zuwa wani matsayin. Kayan jarrabõyinmu, da aka samar a kan jama'a masu yawa na fassarar kwamfyutan AsL, a cikin jangwani, ya nuna muhimu wa zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane kamar wata ƙunci na nemi da ake samu. Tuduniyarmu yana samar da hanyoyin bazalin da aka riga wa aikin aiki a gaba ɗaya.", 'he': 'עיבוד שפת טבעי לסרטון שפת סימנים -- כולל משימות כמו זיהוי, תרגום, וחיפוש -- הוא קריטי לגרום טכנולוגיות אינטליגנציה מלאכותית גישות לאדם חירש, והוא מקבל עניין מחקר בשנים האחרונות. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמודדים עם הבעיה של חיפוש אחר מילים מפתחות מאיית אצבעות או ביטויים מפתחים בסרטים של שפת סימנים גרועה. This is an important task since significant content in sign language is often conveyed via fingerspelling, and to our knowledge the task has not been studied before.   אנו מציעים מודל סוף-סוף למשימה הזאת, FSS-Net, שמגלה ביחד את האיית אצבעות ומתאים אותה לרצף טקסט. הניסויים שלנו, שעשו על קבוצת מידע ציבורית גדולה של אצבעות ASL בפרא, מראים את החשיבות של זיהוי אצבעות כחלק של דוגמא חיפוש ושחזור. הדוגמא שלנו יוצאת משמעות יותר משיטות בסיסית מתאימות מעבודה קודמת על משימות קשורות.', 'sk': 'Obdelava naravnega jezika za video v znakovnem jeziku – vključno z nalogami, kot so prepoznavanje, prevajanje in iskanje – je ključnega pomena za dostop do tehnologij umetne inteligence gluhih posameznikom in v zadnjih letih pridobiva zanimanje za raziskave. V tem prispevku bomo obravnavali problem iskanja ključnih besed ali ključnih besednih zvez v surovih videoposnetkih znakovnega jezika. To je pomembna naloga, saj se pomembne vsebine znakovnega jezika pogosto prenašajo s prstnim črkovanjem in po našem znanju te naloge še nismo preučevali. Za to nalogo predlagamo model od konca do konca, FSS-Net, ki skupaj zazna prstno črkovanje in ga ujema z besedilnim zaporedjem. Naši eksperimenti, opravljeni na velikem javnem naboru podatkov o ASL prstnem črkovanju v naravi, kažejo pomen zaznavanja prstnega črkovanja kot komponente modela iskanja in iskanja. Naš model znatno presega osnovne metode, prilagojene predhodnemu delu na povezanih nalogah.', 'bo': 'Natural language processing for sign language video---including tasks like recognition, translation, and search---is crucial for making artificial intelligence technologies accessible to deaf individuals, and is gaining research interest in recent years. འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང འདི་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་དུ་ནང་དོན་གལ་ཆེ་བའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་དག་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་དོན་ལ་end-to-end་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་FSS-Net་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཆེ་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲིག་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་ནང ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་དེ་ལས་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་རྨན་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་སྒྱུ'}
{'en': 'CAMERO Consistency Regularized Ensemble of Perturbed Language Models with Weight Sharing', 'ar': 'استقراء المهارة والتخطيط مع اللغة الكامنة', 'fr': 'Initiation aux compétences et planification avec le langage latent', 'pt': 'Indução de habilidades e planejamento com linguagem latente', 'es': 'Inducción y planificación de habilidades con lenguaje latente', 'ja': '潜在言語によるスキル紹介と計画', 'zh': '潜伏之技归规画', 'ru': 'Ознакомление с навыками и планирование с использованием скрытого языка', 'hi': 'अव्यक्त भाषा के साथ कौशल प्रेरण और योजना', 'ga': 'Ionduchtú agus Pleanáil Scil le Teanga Folaigh', 'hu': 'Készség indukció és tervezés Latent Language', 'el': 'Επαγωγή δεξιοτήτων και προγραμματισμός με τη Λατινική Γλώσσα', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Induzione e pianificazione delle competenze con il linguaggio latente', 'kk': 'Кейінгі тіл арқылы өзгерту және жоспарлау', 'lt': 'Įgūdžių ugdymas ir planavimas vėlesne kalba', 'mk': 'Индукција и планирање на вештини со последен јазик', 'ml': 'ലാറ്റിന്\u200dറെ ഭാഷ കൊണ്ട് ഇന്\u200dഡിനോഷനും പരിപാടിയും സ്കൈക്കോള്\u200d ചെയ്യുക', 'ms': 'Induksi dan Rencanaan Skill dengan Bahasa Terlambat', 'mt': 'L-Induzzjoni u l-Ippjanar tal-Ħiliet bil-Lingwa Latenti', 'no': 'Comment', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хэл дээр Skill Induction болон Planning', 'pl': 'Indukcja umiejętności i planowanie z językiem latent', 'ro': 'Inducția și planificarea abilităților cu limbajul latent', 'sr': 'Skilna indukcija i planiranje sa poslednjim jezikom', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Ku sameynta hagitaanka iyo qorsheynta luqada ugu dambeeya', 'sv': 'Förmåga Induktion och planering med Latent Language', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kỹ năng đầu tư và kế hoạch với ngôn ngữ gần', 'bg': 'Индукция на умения и планиране с латентен език', 'nl': 'Vaardigheidsinductie en planning met latente taal', 'da': 'Færdighedsinduktion og planlægning med Latent Language', 'hr': 'Skitni Indukcija i planiranje s posljednjim jezikom', 'de': 'Skill Induction und Planung mit latenter Sprache', 'id': 'Induksi dan Rencana Skill dengan Bahasa Terlambat', 'fa': 'فعالیت و برنامه ریزی با زبان اخیر', 'ko': '잠재적 언어의 기능 귀납과 계획', 'sw': 'Uongozaji na Mpango kwa lugha ya hivi karibuni', 'tr': 'Ýakyndaky Dil bilen Ullanma we Planlaşdyrma', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Induktimi dhe planifikimi i aftësive me gjuhën e vonuar', 'hy': 'Համակարգի ինդուկցիան և պլանավորումը վերջին լեզվով', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Sonrakı dillə Skill Induction və Planning', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Skitni Indukcija i planiranje sa kasnim jezikom', 'ca': 'Inducció i planificació de habilitats amb el llenguatge Latent', 'cs': 'Indukce dovedností a plánování s latentním jazykem', 'et': 'Oskuste indutseerimine ja planeerimine latentkeelega', 'fi': 'Taitojen induktio ja suunnittelu latenttikielellä', 'jv': 'YASCII Ngubah Kemerdekaan Karo Mbalasi', 'sk': 'Indukcija spretnosti in načrtovanje z latentnim jezikom', 'he': 'תוכנית ומיומנות עם שפה מאוחרת', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཤུལ་མའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་འགོ་སློང་བའི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་དང་གླེང་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Model ensemble is a popular approach to produce a low variance and well generalized model However it   induces large memory and inference costs which is often not affordable for real world deployment Existing work has resorted to sharing weights among models However when increasing the proportion of the shared weights the resulting models tend to be similar and the benefits of using model ensemble diminish To retain ensemble benefits while maintaining a low memory cost we propose a consistency regularized ensemble learning approach based on perturbed models named CAMERO Specifically we share the weights of bottom layers across all models and apply different perturbations to the hidden representations for different models which can effectively promote the model diversity Meanwhile we apply a prediction consistency regularizer across the perturbed models to control the variance due to the model diversity Our experiments using large language models demonstrate that CAMERO significantly improves the generalization performance of the ensemble model Specifically CAMERO outperforms the standard ensemble of BERT base models on the GLUE benchmark by 0.7 with a significantly smaller model size 114.2$M vs. 880.6$M', 'ar': 'نقدم إطارًا لتعلم السياسات الهرمية من العروض التوضيحية ، باستخدام التعليقات التوضيحية اللغوية الطبيعية المتناثرة لتوجيه اكتشاف المهارات القابلة لإعادة الاستخدام لصنع القرار المستقل. نقوم بصياغة نموذج توليدي لتسلسلات العمل حيث تولد الأهداف تسلسلات من أوصاف المهام الفرعية عالية المستوى ، وتولد هذه الأوصاف تسلسلات من الإجراءات منخفضة المستوى. نحن نصف كيفية تدريب هذا النموذج باستخدام العروض التوضيحية غير المشروحة في المقام الأول عن طريق تحليل العروض التوضيحية إلى تسلسلات من المهام الفرعية عالية المستوى المسماة ، باستخدام عدد صغير فقط من التعليقات التوضيحية الأولية للغة الأساسية أثناء العمل. في النماذج المدربة ، تقوم أوامر اللغة الطبيعية بفهرسة مكتبة اندماجية من المهارات ؛ يمكن للوكلاء استخدام هذه المهارات للتخطيط من خلال إنشاء تسلسل تعليمي عالي المستوى مصمم خصيصًا لأهداف جديدة. نقوم بتقييم هذا النهج في بيئة المحاكاة المنزلية ALFRED ، حيث نقدم تعليقات توضيحية باللغة الطبيعية لـ 10٪ فقط من العروض التوضيحية. إنه يحقق أداءً مشابهًا لأحدث النماذج على معدل نجاح ALFRED ، متفوقًا على العديد من الأساليب الحديثة مع إمكانية الوصول إلى خطط الحقيقة الأرضية أثناء التدريب والتقييم.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un cadre d'apprentissage des politiques hiérarchiques à partir de démonstrations, en utilisant des annotations en langage naturel clairsemées pour guider la découverte de compétences réutilisables pour la prise de décision autonome. Nous formulons un modèle génératif de séquences d'actions dans lequel les objectifs génèrent des séquences de descriptions de sous-tâches de haut niveau, et ces descriptions génèrent des séquences d'actions de bas niveau. Nous décrivons comment entraîner ce modèle en utilisant principalement des démonstrations non annotées en analysant les démonstrations en séquences de sous-tâches nommées de haut niveau, en utilisant uniquement un petit nombre d'annotations de base pour le langage de base en action. Dans les modèles entraînés, les commandes en langage naturel indexent une bibliothèque combinatoire de compétences\xa0; les agents peuvent utiliser ces compétences pour planifier en générant des séquences d'instructions de haut niveau adaptées à de nouveaux objectifs. Nous évaluons cette approche dans l'environnement de simulation domestique ALFRED, en fournissant des annotations en langage naturel pour seulement 10\xa0% des démonstrations. Il permet d'obtenir des modèles de pointe comparables aux performances sur le taux de réussite d'ALFRED, surpassant plusieurs méthodes récentes avec accès à des plans de vérification de terrain pendant la formation et l'évaluation.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma estrutura para aprender políticas hierárquicas a partir de demonstrações, usando anotações esparsas em linguagem natural para orientar a descoberta de habilidades reutilizáveis para tomada de decisão autônoma. Formulamos um modelo generativo de sequências de ação em que os objetivos geram sequências de descrições de subtarefas de alto nível e essas descrições geram sequências de ações de baixo nível. Descrevemos como treinar esse modelo usando principalmente demonstrações não anotadas, analisando demonstrações em sequências de subtarefas de alto nível nomeadas, usando apenas um pequeno número de anotações iniciais para a linguagem básica em ação. Em modelos treinados, comandos de linguagem natural indexam uma biblioteca combinatória de habilidades; os agentes podem usar essas habilidades para planejar, gerando sequências de instrução de alto nível adaptadas a novos objetivos. Avaliamos essa abordagem no ambiente de simulação domiciliar ALFRED, fornecendo anotações em linguagem natural para apenas 10% das demonstrações. Ele atinge modelos de última geração comparáveis em desempenho na taxa de sucesso do ALFRED, superando vários métodos recentes com acesso a planos de verdade durante o treinamento e a avaliação.', 'es': 'Presentamos un marco para aprender políticas jerárquicas a partir de demostraciones, utilizando anotaciones escasas en lenguaje natural para guiar el descubrimiento de habilidades reutilizables para la toma de decisiones autónoma. Formulamos un modelo generativo de secuencias de acción en el que los objetivos generan secuencias de descripciones de subtareas de alto nivel, y estas descripciones generan secuencias de acciones de bajo nivel. Describimos cómo entrenar este modelo utilizando principalmente demostraciones sin anotaciones, analizando las demostraciones en secuencias de subtareas nombradas de alto nivel, utilizando solo un pequeño número de anotaciones iniciales para fundamentar el lenguaje en acción. En los modelos entrenados, los comandos del lenguaje natural indexan una biblioteca combinatoria de habilidades; los agentes pueden usar estas habilidades para planificar mediante la generación de secuencias de instrucción de alto nivel adaptadas a objetivos novedosos. Evaluamos este enfoque en el entorno de simulación de hogares de ALFRED, proporcionando anotaciones en lenguaje natural solo para el 10% de las demostraciones. Logra un rendimiento comparable con modelos de vanguardia en la tasa de éxito de ALFRED, superando a varios métodos recientes con acceso a planes de verdad sobre el terreno durante la capacitación y la evaluación.', 'ja': '私たちは、自律的な意思決定のための再利用可能なスキルの発見を導くために、まばらな自然言語注釈を使用して、デモンストレーションから階層的な政策を学習するためのフレームワークを提示します。 目標が高レベルのサブタスク記述のシーケンスを生成し、これらの記述が低レベルのアクションのシーケンスを生成するアクションシーケンスの生成モデルを策定する。 私たちは、主に注釈のないデモンストレーションを使用してこのモデルをトレーニングする方法について説明します。デモンストレーションを名前付きのハイレベルなサブタスクのシーケンスに構文解析し、実際に地上言語を使用するための少数のシードアノテーションのみを使用します。 訓練されたモデルでは、自然言語コマンドはスキルの組み合わせライブラリをインデックス化します。エージェントは、新規の目標に合わせた高レベルのインストラクションシーケンスを生成することによって、これらのスキルを使用して計画することができます。 私たちは、このアプローチをアルフレッドの家庭シミュレーション環境で評価し、デモのわずか10 ％に自然言語の注釈を提供します。 ALFREDの成功率に匹敵する最先端モデルのパフォーマンスを実現し、トレーニングおよび評価中に地道な計画にアクセスすることで、最近のいくつかの方法を上回ります。', 'hi': 'हम स्वायत्त निर्णय लेने के लिए पुन: प्रयोज्य कौशल की खोज का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए विरल प्राकृतिक भाषा एनोटेशन का उपयोग करके प्रदर्शनों से पदानुक्रमित नीतियों को सीखने के लिए एक रूपरेखा प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम एक्शन सीक्वेंस का एक जेनरेटिव मॉडल तैयार करते हैं जिसमें लक्ष्य उच्च-स्तरीय सबटास्क विवरणों के अनुक्रम उत्पन्न करते हैं, और ये विवरण निम्न-स्तरीय क्रियाओं के अनुक्रम उत्पन्न करते हैं। हम वर्णन करते हैं कि इस मॉडल को मुख्य रूप से अननोटेड प्रदर्शनों का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए नामित उच्च-स्तरीय उप-कार्यों के अनुक्रमों में प्रदर्शनों को पार्स करके, कार्रवाई में जमीनी भाषा में केवल थोड़ी संख्या में बीज एनोटेशन का उपयोग करके। प्रशिक्षित मॉडल में, प्राकृतिक भाषा आदेश कौशल के एक संयुक्त पुस्तकालय को अनुक्रमित करते हैं; एजेंट उपन्यास लक्ष्यों के अनुरूप उच्च-स्तरीय अनुदेश अनुक्रम उत्पन्न करके योजना बनाने के लिए इन कौशलों का उपयोग कर सकते हैं। हम अल्फ्रेड घरेलू सिमुलेशन वातावरण में इस दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, केवल 10% प्रदर्शनों के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा एनोटेशन प्रदान करते हैं। यह अल्फ्रेड सफलता दर पर प्रदर्शन तुलनीय अत्याधुनिक मॉडल प्राप्त करता है, प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन के दौरान जमीनी-सत्य योजनाओं तक पहुंच के साथ कई हालिया तरीकों को मात देता है।', 'zh': '立一策之框架,用疏自然语言之解以导可用之技,以成自决之策。 我制一动作序列的生成模样,其中的生成高级子描述序列,这述生成小级操作序列。 吾言大未注以练之,法以解析为名,子以少注为实。 其训练模形,自然语言令索引合技能库。 智可以生新量身制可以成名。 ALFRED家模拟环境中评此法,止为10%演供自然语言注。 其于ALFRED成功率上得先进之形,于训评之间访地实计,优于最新法。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем структуру для изучения иерархической политики на демонстрациях, используя редкие аннотации на естественном языке для руководства открытием многоразовых навыков для автономного принятия решений. Формулируем генеративную модель последовательностей действий, в которой цели генерируют последовательности высокоуровневых описаний подзадач, а эти описания генерируют последовательности низкоуровневых действий. Мы описываем, как обучить эту модель, используя в первую очередь неаннотированные демонстрации, анализируя демонстрации в последовательности именованных подзадач высокого уровня, используя лишь небольшое количество аннотаций семян для определения языка в действии. В обученных моделях команды естественного языка индексируют комбинаторную библиотеку навыков; агенты могут использовать эти навыки для планирования, генерируя последовательности инструкций высокого уровня, адаптированные к новым целям. Мы оцениваем этот подход в среде бытового моделирования АЛЬФРЕДА, предоставляя аннотации на естественном языке только для 10% демонстраций. Она достигает производительности сопоставимых современных моделей на уровне успеха АЛЬФРЕДА, превосходя несколько недавних методов с доступом к наземным планам истины во время обучения и оценки.', 'ga': "Cuirimid creat i láthair chun beartais ordlathacha a fhoghlaim ó thaispeántais, ag baint úsáide as nótaí tearca teanga nádúrtha chun fionnachtain scileanna ath-inúsáidte le haghaidh cinnteoireachta uathrialaitheach a threorú. Déanaimid múnla giniúna de sheichimh ghníomhaíochta ina ngineann spriocanna seichimh de chur síos ar fhothasc ardleibhéil, agus gineann na tuairiscí seo seichimh de ghníomhartha ar leibhéal íseal. Déanaimid cur síos ar conas an tsamhail seo a thraenáil trí úsáid a bhaint as taispeántais neamhótáilte go príomha trí thaispeántais a pharsáil ina seichimh d'fho-thascanna ardleibhéil ainmnithe, gan ach líon beag nótaí síolta a úsáid chun teanga na talún i mbun gnímh. I múnlaí oilte, innéacsaíonn orduithe teanga nádúrtha leabharlann chomhcheangailte scileanna; is féidir le gníomhairí na scileanna seo a úsáid chun pleanáil a dhéanamh trí sheichimh teagaisc ardleibhéil a ghiniúint atá in oiriúint do spriocanna núíosacha. Déanaimid measúnú ar an gcur chuige seo i dtimpeallacht ionsamhlúcháin teaghlaigh ALFRED, ag soláthar nótaí teanga nádúrtha le haghaidh 10% de na taispeántais amháin. Baineann sé amach samhlacha den scoth inchomparáide feidhmíochta ar ráta ratha ALFRED, ag dul i bhfeabhas níos fearr ar roinnt modhanna a rinneadh le déanaí le rochtain ar phleananna fhírinneachta le linn oiliúna agus meastóireachta.", 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα πλαίσιο για την εκμάθηση ιεραρχικών πολιτικών από διαδηλώσεις, χρησιμοποιώντας αραιές σημειώσεις φυσικής γλώσσας για να καθοδηγήσουμε την ανακάλυψη επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμων δεξιοτήτων για αυτόνομη λήψη αποφάσεων. Διαμορφώνουμε ένα παραγωγικό μοντέλο ακολουθιών ενεργειών στο οποίο οι στόχοι παράγουν ακολουθίες περιγραφών δευτερεύουσας εργασίας υψηλού επιπέδου, και αυτές οι περιγραφές δημιουργούν ακολουθίες ενεργειών χαμηλού επιπέδου. Περιγράφουμε πώς να εκπαιδεύσουμε αυτό το μοντέλο χρησιμοποιώντας κυρίως μη σημειωμένες επιδείξεις αναλύοντας τις επιδείξεις σε ακολουθίες ονομασμένων υπο-εργασιών υψηλού επιπέδου, χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο έναν μικρό αριθμό σχολίων σπόρων στη γλώσσα εδάφους σε δράση. Σε εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα, οι εντολές φυσικής γλώσσας δείχνουν μια συνδυασμένη βιβλιοθήκη δεξιοτήτων. Οι πράκτορες μπορούν να χρησιμοποιήσουν αυτές τις δεξιότητες για να σχεδιάσουν δημιουργώντας ακολουθίες διδασκαλίας υψηλού επιπέδου προσαρμοσμένες σε νέους στόχους. Αξιολογούμε αυτή την προσέγγιση στο περιβάλλον προσομοίωσης νοικοκυριού παρέχοντας σχόλια φυσικής γλώσσας μόνο για 10% των επιδείξεων. Επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις συγκρίσιμα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για το ποσοστό επιτυχίας του ξεπερνώντας αρκετές πρόσφατες μεθόδους με πρόσβαση σε βασικά σχέδια κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης και της αξιολόγησης.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a hierarchikus politikák tanulásának keretét demonstrációkból, ritka természetes nyelvi megjegyzések segítségével, hogy irányítsák az autonóm döntéshozatal újrafelhasználható készségeinek felfedezését. Az akciószekvenciák generációs modelljét készítjük, amelyben a célok magas szintű részfeladatleírások sorozatait generálják, és ezek a leírások alacsony szintű akciók sorozatait generálják. Leírjuk, hogyan képezzük ezt a modellt elsősorban jelöletlen demonstrációkkal, úgy, hogy a demonstrációkat a nevezett magas szintű alfeladatok sorozatába elemezzük, csak kis számú vetőjegyzetet használva a földi nyelvhez. A képzett modellekben a természetes nyelvi parancsok mutatják a készségek kombinációs könyvtárát; Az ügynökök ezeket a készségeket felhasználhatják a tervezéshez, új célokra szabott magas szintű oktatási sorozatok létrehozásával. Ezt a megközelítést az ALFRED háztartási szimulációs környezetben értékeljük, természetes nyelvi megjegyzéseket biztosítva a demonstrációk mindössze 10%-ához. Az ALFRED sikerességi arányának teljesítményével összehasonlítható, korszerű modelleket ér el, több újabb módszert felülmúlva a képzés és az értékelés során való hozzáféréssel.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ჰიერაქტიკური პოლიტიკის სასწავლად დემონსტრაციებიდან, გამოყენებული ნაირადი ენის ანოტაციების გამოყენება, რომლებიც ავტონომიური გადაწყვეტილებისთვის გამოყენებ ჩვენ განვიყენებთ წარმოდგენტიური მოდელის მოდელის, რომელიც მიზეზები უფრო მეტი დონეზე მეტი წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების და ეს წარმო ჩვენ განვიწყებთ, როგორ ამ მოდელს გასწავლის გამოყენებას, პირველად არ განვიწყებული დემონსტრაციების გამოყენებით, როგორც დემონსტრაციები გასწავლით სახელის სახელის სახელის სახელის სახელის წერები შესწავლილი მოდელში, ნაირთი ენის მოდელების ინდექსია კომბინონიტური ინდექსია კომბინონიტური ინდექსია კომბინონიტური ინდექსია; ადვნენტები შეუძლია გამოიყენოთ ეს მეცნიერება, რომელიც პრომენტის მიზეზებისთვის შექმნა მარტივი დონე ინსტრუქციის სერექციების შესახებ. ჩვენ ამ პროგრამა ALFRED სახლის სიმულაციის გარეშე გავუმუშავებთ, რომელიც მართლაც 10% დემონსტრაციების მონაცემებებისთვის მივიღებთ. ეს მიიღება სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ მსგავსი მადელების შესაბამისი მდგომარეობა, რომლებიც ALFRED წარმოდგენების სინამდგომარეობით, რამდენიმე მხოლოდ მეტოვები, რომ', 'it': "Presentiamo un framework per l'apprendimento delle politiche gerarchiche dalle dimostrazioni, utilizzando scarse annotazioni di linguaggio naturale per guidare la scoperta di competenze riutilizzabili per un processo decisionale autonomo. Formuliamo un modello generativo di sequenze di azione in cui gli obiettivi generano sequenze di descrizioni di sottoattività di alto livello, e queste descrizioni generano sequenze di azioni di basso livello. Descriviamo come addestrare questo modello utilizzando principalmente dimostrazioni non notate analizzando le dimostrazioni in sequenze di sottocompiti ad alto livello denominati, utilizzando solo un piccolo numero di annotazioni di seme al linguaggio di base in azione. Nei modelli formati, i comandi del linguaggio naturale indicizzano una libreria combinata di competenze; Gli agenti possono utilizzare queste abilità per pianificare generando sequenze di istruzione di alto livello adattate a nuovi obiettivi. Valutiamo questo approccio nell'ambiente di simulazione domestica ALFRED, fornendo annotazioni in linguaggio naturale solo per il 10% delle dimostrazioni. Raggiunge modelli di performance paragonabili allo stato dell'arte sul tasso di successo di ALFRED, superando diversi metodi recenti con accesso ai piani di verità del terreno durante la formazione e la valutazione.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame hierarchinės politikos mokymosi iš demonstracijų sistemą, naudojant retas natūralių kalbų anotacijas, kuriomis vadovaujamasi atskleisti pakartotinai naudojamus įgūdžius savarankiškam sprendimų priėmimui. Suformuojame kartotinį veiksmų sekų model į, kuriame tikslai sukuria aukšto lygio požymių aprašymų sekas, ir šie aprašymai sukuria mažo lygio veiksmų sekas. We describe how to train this model using primarily unannotated demonstrations by parsing demonstrations into sequences of named high-level sub-tasks, using only a small number of seed annotations to ground language in action.  Mokytuose modeliuose gamtinės kalbos įsakymai rodo kombinacinę įgūdžių biblioteką; agents can use these skills to plan by generating high-level instruction sequences tailored to novel goals.  Vertiname šį metodą ALFRED namų ūkių modeliavimo aplinkoje, teikiant natūralias kalbų anotacijas tik 10 proc. demonstracijų. Ji sukuria palyginamus pažangiausius ALFRED sėkmės rodiklių modelius, o mokymo ir vertinimo metu ji viršija keletą neseniai atliktų metodų, pagal kuriuos galima naudotis konkrečios tiesos planais.', 'kk': 'Біз демонстрациялардан иерархиялық саясаттарды оқыту үшін, автономды шешімдеу үшін қайта қолдануға мүмкіндіктерді табу үшін табиғи тілдерді жаңарту арқылы қолданамыз. Жоғары деңгейіндегі төменгі сұраныстың таңдамаларын жасайтын әрекеттер ретінің құрамындағы үлгісін формуладық. Бұл таңдамалары төменгі деңгейіндегі әрекеттердің ретін құрады. Біз бұл үлгісін негізінде белгілі демонстрациялармен, демонстрацияларды жоғары деңгейіндегі ішкі тапсырмалар ретінде талдап, әрекетінде тек төменгі тіліне кішкентай таңбалау жазбаларын қолдануға арналған. Оқылған үлгілерде, табиғи тіл командаларында біріктірілген жұмыс жиындарын индекстеп береді. жаңа мақсаттарға сәйкес келтірілген жоғары деңгейіндегі бағдарламаларды жасау үшін жұмыс істемелерін қолдануға болады. Бұл тәсілді ALFRED үй симуляциялау ортасында бағалаймыз. Бұл тәсілді тек 10% демонстрациялау үшін табиғлық тілді жазбалар береді. Бұл ALFRED сәттілік жылдамдығына салыстырылатын әдістер үлгілерін жеткізеді. Бірнеше жаңа әдістерді оқыту мен оқыту кезінде зерттеу жұмыстарына қатынау үшін бірнеше әдісте', 'mk': 'Презентираме рамка за учење хиерархиски политики од демонстрациите, користејќи ретки природни јазични анотации за водење на откритието на повторно употребливи вештини за автономно донесување одлуки. Ние формулираме генеративен модел на акциски секвенции во кој целите генерираат секвенции на високо ниво описи на подпрашања, а овие описи генерираат секвенции на дејства на ниско ниво. Опишуваме како да го обучуваме овој модел користејќи примарно незабележани демонстрации со анализирање на демонстрациите во секвенции на именувани подзадачи на високо ниво, користејќи само мал број на анализи за семето на земјниот јазик во акција. Во обучените модели, наредбите на природниот јазик индексираат комбинаторна библиотека на вештини; агентите можат да ги користат овие вештини за да планираат со генерирање на високо ниво инструкциски секвенции приспособени на нови цели. Го проценуваме овој пристап во средината за симулација на домаќинството Алфред, обезбедувајќи природни јазички анотации за само 10 отсто од демонстрациите. Истиот постигнува споредливи современи модели за успешноста на АЛФРЕД, надминувајќи неколку неодамнешни методи со пристап до плановите за основна вистина за време на обуката и евалуацијата.', 'ml': 'We present a framework for learning hierarchical policies from demonstrations, using sparse natural language annotations to guide the discovery of reusable skills for autonomous decision-making.  നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d മാതൃകയെ രൂപിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്നുനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഉപാധിക വിവരണങ്ങളുട പ്രധാനപ്പെടാത്ത പ്രതിഷേധങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഈ മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഉയര്\u200dന്നുനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്നതി പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലില്\u200d, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ ആജ്ഞാപിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു കോണിട്ടറിയല്\u200d ലൈബ്രറിയില നോവല്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഉയര്\u200dന്ന നിലയിലെ ഉപദേശങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഈ കഴിവു അല്\u200dഫ്രെഡിന്റെ വീട്ടിലെ സിമുലേഷന്\u200d പരിസ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ നടപടിയെ വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രകട എല്\u200dഫ്രെഡിന്റെ വിജയ വിജയത്തിന്റെ വേഗത്തില്\u200d അത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് തുല്യമായ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പരിശീലനത്', 'ms': 'Kami mempersembahkan kerangka untuk mempelajari kebijaksanaan hierarkis dari demonstrasi, menggunakan anotasi bahasa semulajadi yang sedikit untuk menunjukkan penemuan kemampuan yang boleh digunakan semula untuk keputusan otonomi. Kami membentuk model generatif jujukan tindakan yang mana sasaran menghasilkan jujukan deskripsi subtask tahap tinggi, dan deskripsi ini menghasilkan jujukan tindakan tahap rendah. Kami menggambarkan bagaimana untuk melatih model ini menggunakan demonstrasi yang tidak dicatat secara utama dengan hurai demonstrasi ke dalam urutan sub-tugas aras tinggi bernama, menggunakan hanya sejumlah kecil anotasi benih untuk bahasa dasar dalam tindakan. Dalam model terlatih, perintah bahasa alam mengindeks perpustakaan kombinatorial kemampuan; ejen boleh menggunakan kemampuan ini untuk merancang dengan menghasilkan urutan arahan tinggi yang disesuaikan untuk tujuan baru. Kami menilai pendekatan ini dalam persekitaran simulasi rumah tangga ALFRED, menyediakan anotasi bahasa semulajadi hanya untuk 10% demonstrasi. Ia mencapai prestasi model terbaik yang boleh dibandingkan pada kadar kejayaan ALFRED, melampaui beberapa kaedah baru-baru ini dengan akses ke rancangan kebenaran-tanah semasa latihan dan penilaian.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw qafas għat-tagħlim ta' politiki ġerarkiċi mid-dimostrazzjonijiet, bl-użu ta' annotazzjonijiet żgħar fil-lingwi naturali biex niggwidaw l-iskoperta ta' ħiliet li jerġgħu jintużaw għat-teħid ta' deċiżjonijiet awtonomi. Aħna nifformulaw mudell ġenerattiv ta’ sekwenzi ta’ azzjoni li fihom l-għanijiet jiġġeneraw sekwenzi ta’ deskrizzjonijiet ta’ sottotalbiet ta’ livell għoli, u dawn id-deskrizzjonijiet jiġġeneraw sekwenzi ta’ azzjonijiet ta’ livell baxx. Aħna niddeskrivu kif għandna nħarrġu dan il-mudell bl-użu primarjament ta’ dimostrazzjonijiet mhux innotati billi nħarrġu d-dimostrazzjonijiet f’sekwenzi ta’ sottokompiti msejħa ta’ livell għoli, bl-użu ta’ numru żgħir biss ta’ annotazzjonijiet taż-żerriegħa fil-lingwa tal-art f’azzjoni. F’mudelli mħarrġa, kmandi lingwistiċi naturali jindikaw librerija kombinatorja ta’ ħiliet; l-aġenti jistgħu jużaw dawn il-ħiliet biex jippjanaw billi jiġġeneraw sekwenzi ta’ tagħlim ta’ livell għoli mfassla għal għanijiet ġodda. Nivvalutaw dan l-approċċ fl-ambjent ta’ simulazzjoni tad-dar ALFRED, billi nipprovdu annotazzjonijiet lingwistiċi naturali għal 10% biss tad-dimostrazzjonijiet. Hija tikseb mudelli komparabbli ta' prestazzjoni avvanzati dwar ir-rata ta' suċċess tal-ALFRED, li jaqbżu diversi metodi riċenti b'aċċess għal pjanijiet ta' verità fuq l-art matul it-taħriġ u l-evalwazzjoni.", 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit rammeverk for å lære hierarkiske politikk frå demonstrasjonar, ved å bruka sparse naturspråk-notasjonar for å gjera oppdaginga av tilbakebrukbare kvalitetar for autonomt avgjøring. Vi formerer ein generelt modell for handlingseiningar som målar lagar rekkjefølgja av høg nivå underspøringsskildringar, og desse skildringane gjer rekkjefølgja av låg nivå handlingar. Vi beskriver korleis denne modellen skal trenjast med hovudsakelig ukjente demonstrasjonar ved å tolka demonstrasjonar i rekkjefølgja med namnet høg nivå underoppgåver, ved å bruka berre ei liten tal frø- notasjonar til bakgrunnspråk i handlinga. I trengte modeller indekserer naturspråkkommandoar ein kombinasjonsbiblioteke med ferdighetar. agentar kan bruka desse kvalitetane for å planlegge ved å laga høg nivå instruksjonssekvensar som er tilpassa til novel mål. Vi evaluerer denne tilnærminga i miljøet ALFRED-simulasjon av heimemodus, og tilbyr naturspråk-notasjonar for berre 10 % av demonstrasjonar. Det oppnår sammenlignbare tilstandsmodular på ALFRED-sukseshastighet, som utfører fleire nyleg metoder med tilgang til grunnsannhetsplanar under opplæring og evaluering.', 'mn': 'Бид үзүүлэлтийн дахин ашиглах архитекийн засгийн газрыг сурах, байгалийн хэл дахин дахин ашиглах чадварыг автоматжуулах шийдвэр гаргах боломжтой байдлыг ашиглаж байна. Бид бүтээлч үйл ажиллагааны дарааллын загварыг тооцоолж, зорилго нь өндөр түвшинд суурь асуултын дарааллыг бий болгодог бөгөөд эдгээр тайлбар нь бага түвшинд үйл ажиллагааны дарааллыг бий болгодог. Бид энэ загварыг хэрхэн сургах вэ гэдгийг анхны тодорхойгүй үзүүлэлтийг ашиглаж үзүүлэлтийг дээд-түвшин суб-даалгаварын дарааллаар хуваалцаж, зөвхөн жижиг хэмжээний үзүүлэлт хэрэглэж байдаг. Сургуулсан загваруудын хувьд байгалийн хэл нь чадварын нийлүүлэлтийн номын санг индексирдэг. агентууд энэ чадварыг шинэ зорилго руу зориулан өндөр түвшингийн заавал дарааллаар төлөвлөхөд ашиглаж чадна. Бид ALFRED гэр бүлийн шинжлэх ухааны орчинд энэ аргыг үнэлдэг. Байгалийн хэл дээр зөвхөн 10%-ын илтгэл тавьдаг. Энэ нь ALFRED амжилтын хувьд харьцуулагдах урлагийн загваруудыг гаргаж, сургалтын, үнэлгээний үед олон саяхан арга загваруудыг дамжуулах боломжтой болгодог.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un cadru pentru învățarea politicilor ierarhice din demonstrații, folosind adnotări rare de limbaj natural pentru a ghida descoperirea abilităților reutilizabile pentru luarea deciziilor autonome. Formulăm un model generativ de secvențe de acțiune în care obiectivele generează secvențe de descrieri de subactivități de nivel înalt, iar aceste descrieri generează secvențe de acțiuni de nivel scăzut. Descriem cum să instruim acest model folosind în principal demonstrații neanotate prin analizarea demonstrațiilor în secvențe de sub-sarcini numite la nivel înalt, folosind doar un număr mic de adnotări de semințe pentru limbajul terestru în acțiune. În modele instruite, comenzile lingvistice naturale indică o bibliotecă combinatorie de abilități; Agenții pot folosi aceste abilități pentru a planifica prin generarea de secvențe de instrucțiuni de nivel înalt adaptate la obiective noi. Evaluăm această abordare în mediul de simulare casnică ALFRED, oferind adnotări de limbaj natural pentru doar 10% din demonstrații. Realizează performanțe comparabile cu modele de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește rata de succes ALFRED, depășind mai multe metode recente, cu acces la planuri de realitate de bază în timpul instruirii și evaluării.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න හැකියාර්කික විද්\u200dයාපයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න පුළුවන් භාෂා අපි ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සූදානම් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඉලක්කම් ලොකු ස්ත්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තරයක් සූදානම් කරනවා. අපි මේ මෝඩල් එක ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විස්තර කරන්නේ කොහොමද ප්\u200dරභාවිත විස්තර කරන්නේ, ප්\u200dරභාවිත විස්තරයෙන් ප්\u200dරභාවිත විස්තර නැත ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන මොඩේල් වල්, ස්වභාවික භාෂාව අණිවාදයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කළ නියෝජිතයන්ට පුළුවන් මේ කුළුවන්ව භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න අධ්\u200dයතාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න,  අපි මේ විදිහට ALFRED ගෙදරයේ සිමුලේෂණ විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා, ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව පෙන්වන්න 10% විතරයි. ඒක ALFRED සාර්ථක විශ්වාසයේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, අලුත් විද', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo okvir za učenje hijerarhijske politike iz demonstracija, koristeći rezervne prirodne annotacije kako bi vodili otkriće ponovno korištenih vještina za autonomno donošenje odluka. Formiramo generični model akcijskih sekvencija u kojoj ciljevi stvaraju sekvence opisa podpitanja visokog nivoa, a ovi opisi stvaraju sekvence akcija niskog nivoa. Opišemo kako da treniramo ovaj model koristeći primarno neoznačene demonstracije, analizirajući demonstracije u sekvenci podzadataka na višem nivou, koristeći samo mali broj komentacija semena na zemlji jezik u akciji. U obučenim modelima, prirodni jezik zapovijeda indiciranje kombinacijske biblioteke vještina; agenti mogu iskoristiti ove vještine da planiraju stvaranjem sekvencija instrukcije visokog nivoa, prilagođenih novim ciljevima. Procjenjujemo taj pristup u okruženju simulacije domaćih kuća ALFRED-a, pružajući prirodne jezičke annotacije samo 10% demonstracija. To postiže usporedni modeli stanja umjetnosti na stopi uspeha ALFRED-a, koji su iznosili nekoliko nedavnih metoda s pristupom planovima zemaljske istine tijekom obuke i procjene.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் சாக்கியங்களில் இருந்து முனைய கொள்கைகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள ஒரு சட்டத்தை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், தன்னியக்க முடிவு தீர்மானிப்பு தெர நாம் ஒரு பொதுவான செயல் தொடர்களின் மாதிரி உருவாக்குகிறோம். இலக்குகள் அதில் உயர் நிலையின் துணை பணி விவரிப்பை உருவாக்குகிறது, மற்றும் இந்த நாம் இந்த மாதிரியை எப்படி பயிற்சி செய்ய முதலில் எதுவும் முடியாத காட்சிகளை பயன்படுத்தி உயர்நிலை துணை பணிகளின் வரிசையில் பாசிடுகிறோம், அதிக நிலைய பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளில், இயற்கையான மொழி கட்டளைகளுக்கு ஒரு தொகுதி நூலகத்தை சுட்டுகிறது; புதிய இலக்குகளுக்கு மேலான உயர்நிலை கட்டுப்பாட்டு வரிசைகளை உருவாக்கி இந்த த திட்டங்களை பயன்படுத்த முடியும். ALFRED வீட்டு பாவனைப்பு சூழலில் இந்த செயல்பாட்டை நாம் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், சாதாரண மொழி குறிப்புகளில் 10% மட்டும் காட இது ALFRED வெற்றியின் விகிதத்தில் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிடும் கலை மாதிரிகளை பெறுகிறது, பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பிடும் போது பூமியின் சத்', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy ramy nauki hierarchicznej polityki na podstawie demonstracji, wykorzystując rzadkie adnotacje języka naturalnego, aby kierować odkrywaniem umiejętności wielokrotnego użytku do autonomicznego podejmowania decyzji. Formułujemy generatywny model sekwencji działania, w którym cele generują sekwencje opisów podzadań wysokiego poziomu, a te opisy generują sekwencje działań niskiego poziomu. Opisujemy, jak trenować ten model przy użyciu głównie niezapisanych demonstracji poprzez analizowanie demonstracji na sekwencje nazwanych podzadań wysokiego poziomu, używając tylko niewielkiej liczby adnotacji nasiennych do języka podziemnego w akcji. W przeszkolonych modelach polecenia języka naturalnego indeksują kombinatoryjną bibliotekę umiejętności; Agenci mogą wykorzystać te umiejętności do planowania, generując sekwencje instrukcji na wysokim poziomie dostosowane do nowych celów. Oceniamy to podejście w środowisku symulacji gospodarstw domowych ALFRED, dostarczając adnotacji językowych naturalnych tylko dla 10% demonstracji. Osiąga porównywalne, najnowocześniejsze modele na wskaźniku sukcesu ALFRED, przewyższając kilka ostatnich metod z dostępem do podstawowych planów podczas szkolenia i oceny.', 'so': 'Waxaannu muujinnaa qorshaha barashada siyaasadaha hierarkiisa ah oo laga soo bandhigayo demonstratada, waxaana isticmaalaynaa dhibaatooyin luuqada dabiicadda ah oo yar si aan u muuqano aqoonta la isticmaalayo ee go’aanka iskaa’aanta ah. Waxaan sameynaa qaab dhaqan ah oo ay ku dhashaan kooxo lagu qoro sawirida shabakadda sare, oo qoraalkaasna waxay dhashaa kooxo shaqooyinka hoose. Sidaan u tababarinno tusaalahan sida loo isticmaalo waxyaabaha aan la aqoonin ugu horeysa, waxaynu u qoraynaa meelaha lagu magacaabay heerka sare, oo lagu isticmaalayo wax yar oo ku saabsan afka dhulka. Tusaale tababarid ah waxaa lagu amraa afka asalka ah maktabadda labaatanka ah ee xirfadaha; agents can use these skills to plan by generating high-level instruction sequences tailored to novel goals.  Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qaababkan ee xarunta qaabilaadda guriga ee ALFRED, taas oo lagu siinayo dhibaatooyin afka dabiiciga ah 10% oo demonstration ah oo kaliya. Waxay sameynaysaa samooyin u eg qorshaha farshaxanta oo ku saabsan badnaanta liibaanta ALFRED, waxayna sameynaysaa qaabab badan oo ugu dambeysa si ay u heli karto qorshaha runta ah xiliga waxbarashada iyo qiimeynta.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en ram för att lära sig hierarkiska policyer från demonstrationer, med hjälp av glesa naturliga språkanteckningar för att vägleda upptäckten av återanvändbara färdigheter för självständigt beslutsfattande. Vi formulerar en generativ modell av aktionssekvenser där mål genererar sekvenser av högnivåunderuppgiftsbeskrivningar, och dessa beskrivningar genererar sekvenser av lågnivååtgärder. Vi beskriver hur man tränar denna modell med främst oanmälda demonstrationer genom att tolka demonstrationer i sekvenser av namngivna underuppgifter på hög nivå, med endast ett litet antal fröanteckningar till markspråket i aktion. I utbildade modeller indexerar naturliga språkkommandon ett kombinationsbibliotek av färdigheter. Agenter kan använda dessa färdigheter för att planera genom att generera instruktionssekvenser på hög nivå anpassade till nya mål. Vi utvärderar detta tillvägagångssätt i ALFRED hushållssimuleringsmiljö, och tillhandahåller naturligt språk anteckningar för endast 10% av demonstrationerna. Den uppnår prestanda jämförbara state-of-the-art modeller för ALFRED framgångsgrad, överträffar flera nya metoder med tillgång till marksanningsplaner under utbildning och utvärdering.', 'ur': 'ہم نشانیوں سے یورارشیک پولیٹیوں کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک فرم پیش کرتے ہیں، اپنی تصمیم کے لئے دوبارہ استعمال کرنے کے قابل استعمال کرنے کے لئے کم طبیعی زبان کی نشانیاں استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہم نے اچھی سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ سٹ ہم اس مدل کو کس طرح تعلیم دیتے ہیں کہ اس کی تعلیم پہلے ناشناختہ دکھانے کے مطابق دکھانے کے مطابق دکھانے کے ذریعہ سے دکھانے کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ بالا-سطح-ٹاکس کے ناموں میں پارس کریں، صرف زمین کی زبان میں تھوڑی تھوڑی سی تعلیم کی مدلکوں میں، طبیعی زبان کی کماندروں میں ایک کمینٹریال لیبروری کی استعدادات کا انڈیکس کرتا ہے، اگنٹوں کو یہ استعداد استعمال کر سکتے ہیں کہ نئی موجودات کے لئے اچھی سطح کی تعلیم سطح پیدا کریں۔ ہم اِس طریقہ کو ALFRED خانہ دار سیمولیسی آنٹرنیٹ میں مطالبہ کرتے ہیں، صرف 10% دکھانے کے لئے طبیعی زبان کی مطلوبات دیتے ہیں. یہ آلفرد کے موفقیت کے درمیان مقایسہ کے قابل تحقیق کے قابل تحقیق کو پہنچا رہا ہے، بہت اگلے طریقے سے زیادہ مطابق زمین حقیقت کی تدبیر اور ارزیابی کے ذریعہ۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cơ sở để học các chính sách cấp cao từ các cuộc biểu tình, sử dụng các bản ghi chú tự nhiên sơ sài để hướng dẫn việc phát hiện các kỹ năng tái sử dụng cho quyết định tự động. Chúng tôi mô tả một mô hình tác động của các chuỗi hành động trong đó mục tiêu tạo ra các chuỗi mô tả dạng phụ đề cấp cao, và những mô tả này tạo ra chuỗi hành động cấp thấp. Chúng tôi mô tả cách huấn luyện mô hình này bằng cách sử dụng biểu tình hàng đầu không ghi chú bằng cách phân tích biểu tình hình thành chuỗi các công trình ngầm cấp cao được đặt tên, sử dụng chỉ một số lượng nhỏ chú thích hạt giống đến ngôn ngữ mặt đất. Trong các mô hình được huấn luyện, ngôn ngữ tự nhiên chỉ huy một thư viện các kỹ năng. đặc vụ có thể sử dụng kỹ năng này để lên kế hoạch bằng cách tạo ra những dãy hướng dẫn cấp cao phù hợp với mục tiêu mới. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp này trong môi trường mô phỏng nhà ở ALFRD, cung cấp niên chú thích ngôn ngữ tự nhiên chỉ mười phần trăm cuộc biểu tình. Nó đạt được các mô hình hiện đại tương đương về tỷ lệ thành công ALFRD, vượt qua nhiều phương pháp gần đây có thể tiếp cận với kế hoạch thực tế dưới đất trong thời gian huấn luyện và đánh giá.', 'uz': "Biz tashqi qoidalarni tashqi o'rganish uchun qoidamizni hozir qilamiz, o'zimni avtomatik boshqarish uchun qo'llanmalarni o'rganish uchun asl tilni taʼminlovchilar yordamida foydalanish uchun foydalanish imkoniyatini ko'rsatish mumkin. Biz amal chegaralarini yaratish uchun generativ modelni yaratishmiz. Bu qanday maqolalar eng darajadagi sub- vazifa taʼriflarini yaratish mumkin, va bu taʼriflar lavha amallarning chegaralarini yaratadi. Biz bu modelni qanday o'rganishni aslida nomaʼlum qilmagan demonstratlardan foydalanishimiz mumkin. Ushbu hujjatlarni yuqori darajadagi sub-vazifalarga saqlash imkoniyatlariga qo'yish mumkin. Taʼminlovchi modellarda, tabiiy til buyruqlarini bir kombinaatory kutubxona indeksi qiladi; va tashkilotlar yordam maqsadlariga qo'llanilgan yuqori darajada ta'minlovchi soʻzni yaratish mumkin. Biz bu usulni ALFRED uy simuliyatsiya muhitida qiymatmiz, bu tilning tabiiy tajribalarini faqat 10% demonstration uchun sodda tilni taʼminlashtiramiz. Bu amalni ALFRED muvaffaqiyatlarida o'xshash holat modellariga bajaradi, va taʼminlovchi va qiymatlash paytidagi bir necha qanchalik usullarni bajaradi.", 'bg': 'Представяме рамка за изучаване на йерархични политики от демонстрации, използвайки оскъдни анотации на естествения език, за да насочим откриването на умения за многократна употреба за автономно вземане на решения. Формулираме генеративен модел на последователности на действие, в който целите генерират последователности от описания на подзадачите на високо ниво, а тези описания генерират последователности от действия на ниско ниво. Описваме как да тренираме този модел, използвайки предимно неописани демонстрации, като анализираме демонстрациите в последователности от назовани подзадачи на високо ниво, използвайки само малък брой семенни анотации на земния език в действие. При обучените модели командите на естествения език индексират комбинаторна библиотека от умения; агентите могат да използват тези умения за планиране чрез генериране на инструкции на високо ниво, съобразени с новите цели. Ние оценяваме този подход в средата на симулация на домакинствата на АЛФРЕД, като предоставяме анотации на естествен език само за 10% от демонстрациите. Той постига сравними резултати с най-съвременни модели за процента на успех на АЛФРЕД, надминавайки няколко скорошни метода с достъп до планове за действителност по време на обучение и оценка.', 'nl': "We presenteren een kader voor het leren van hiërarchisch beleid van demonstraties, met behulp van schaarse annotaties in natuurlijke taal om de ontdekking van herbruikbare vaardigheden voor autonome besluitvorming te begeleiden. We formuleren een generatief model van actiesequenties waarin doelen sequenties genereren van subtakenbeschrijvingen op hoog niveau, en deze beschrijvingen genereren sequenties van acties op laag niveau. We beschrijven hoe we dit model kunnen trainen met primair ongenoteerde demonstraties door demonstraties te parsen in sequenties van benoemde subtaken op hoog niveau, waarbij slechts een klein aantal zaadaantekeningen worden gebruikt om grondtaal in actie te brengen. In getrainde modellen indexeren natuurlijke taalcommando's een combinatorische bibliotheek van vaardigheden; Agenten kunnen deze vaardigheden gebruiken om te plannen door instructiesequenties op hoog niveau te genereren die zijn afgestemd op nieuwe doelen. We evalueren deze aanpak in de ALFRED-huishoudsimulatieomgeving en leveren aantekeningen in natuurlijke taal voor slechts 10% demonstraties. Het bereikt prestatievergelijkbare state-of-the-art modellen op ALFRED succespercentage en presteert beter dan verschillende recente methoden met toegang tot grondwaarheidsplannen tijdens training en evaluatie.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo okvir za učenje hijerarhičke politike iz demonstracija, koristeći rezervne prirodne oznake kako bi vodili otkriće ponovno korištenih vještina za autonomno donošenje odluka. Formiramo generični model akcijskih sekvencija u kojem ciljevi stvaraju sekvence opisa podupitnika visokog nivoa, a ovi opisi stvaraju sekvence akcija niskog nivoa. Opišemo kako obučavati ovaj model koristeći primarno neoznačene demonstracije, analizirajući demonstracije u sekvencijama podzadataka na višem nivou, koristeći samo mali broj komentacija sjemena na zemlji jezik u akciji. U obučenim modelima, prirodni jezički zapovijedi indiciraju kombiniranu biblioteku vještina; agenti mogu koristiti te vještine kako bi planirali stvaranjem sekvencija instrukcija visokog nivoa prilagođenih novim ciljevima. Procjenjujemo taj pristup u okruženju simulacije kućanstva ALFRED-a, pružajući prirodne oznake za samo 10% demonstracija. To postiže usporedbljive modele stanja umjetnosti na stopi uspjeha ALFRED-a, koji su iznosili nekoliko nedavnih metoda s pristupom planovima zemaljske istine tijekom obuke i procjene.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en ramme for læring af hierarkiske politikker fra demonstrationer ved hjælp af sparsomme natursprogannoteringer til at vejlede opdagelsen af genanvendelige færdigheder til selvstændig beslutningstagning. Vi formulerer en generativ model af handlingssekvenser, hvor mål genererer sekvenser af underopgavebeskrivelser på højt niveau, og disse beskrivelser genererer sekvenser af handlinger på lavt niveau. Vi beskriver, hvordan man træner denne model ved hjælp af primært unanotate demonstrationer ved at analysere demonstrationer i sekvenser af navngivne underopgaver på højt niveau, ved hjælp af kun et lille antal frønoter til grundsprog i aktion. I uddannede modeller indekserer natursprogkommandoer et kombinatorisk bibliotek af færdigheder; Agenter kan bruge disse færdigheder til at planlægge ved at generere instruktionssekvenser på højt niveau skræddersyet til nye mål. Vi evaluerer denne fremgangsmåde i ALFRED husholdningssimulationsmiljøet og giver kun 10% af demonstrationerne anmærkninger til natursprog. Det opnår præstationssammenlignelige state-of-the-art modeller på ALFRED succesrate og overgår flere nye metoder med adgang til jordsandhedsplaner under træning og evaluering.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan rangkaian untuk mempelajari kebijaksanaan hierarkis dari demonstrasi, menggunakan anotasi bahasa alam yang sedikit untuk memimpin penemuan kemampuan yang dapat digunakan kembali untuk membuat keputusan otonom. Kami membentuk model generatif urutan aksi di mana tujuan menghasilkan urutan dari deskripsi subtask tingkat tinggi, dan deskripsi ini menghasilkan urutan aksi tingkat rendah. Kami menggambarkan cara untuk melatih model ini menggunakan demonstrasi yang tidak dicatat secara utama dengan menghurai demonstrasi menjadi urutan dari sub-tugas tingkat tinggi bernama, menggunakan hanya sejumlah kecil anotasi benih untuk bahasa tanah dalam tindakan. Dalam model terlatih, perintah bahasa alam mengindikasikan perpustakaan kombinatorial keterampilan; agents can use these skills to plan by generating high-level instruction sequences tailored to novel goals.  Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan ini di lingkungan simulasi rumah tangga ALFRED, menyediakan anotasi bahasa alami hanya untuk 10% demonstrasi. Ini mencapai prestasi model terbaik yang dapat dibandingkan pada tingkat sukses ALFRED, melampaui beberapa metode baru-baru ini dengan akses ke rencana kebenaran-tanah selama latihan dan evaluasi.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein Framework für das Erlernen hierarchischer Richtlinien anhand von Demonstrationen, wobei spärliche Anmerkungen natürlicher Sprache verwendet werden, um die Entdeckung wiederverwendbarer Fähigkeiten für autonome Entscheidungsfindung zu leiten. Wir formulieren ein generatives Modell von Aktionssequenzen, in dem Ziele Sequenzen von Subtask-Beschreibungen auf hoher Ebene generieren und diese Beschreibungen Sequenzen von Aktionen auf niedriger Ebene generieren. Wir beschreiben, wie dieses Modell mit primär nicht notierten Demonstrationen trainiert werden kann, indem Demonstrationen in Sequenzen benannter High-Level-Sub-Tasks geparst werden, wobei nur eine geringe Anzahl von Seed-Annotationen zur Grundsprache in Aktion verwendet wird. In trainierten Modellen indexieren natürliche Sprachbefehle eine kombinatorische Bibliothek von Fähigkeiten; Agenten können diese Fähigkeiten nutzen, um zu planen, indem sie hochrangige Instruktionssequenzen generieren, die auf neue Ziele zugeschnitten sind. Wir evaluieren diesen Ansatz in der ALFRED-Haushaltssimulationsumgebung und liefern natursprachliche Annotationen für nur 10% der Demonstrationen. Es erreicht leistungsvergleichbare State-of-the-Art Modelle zur ALFRED Erfolgsrate und übertrifft mehrere neuere Methoden mit Zugang zu Ground-Truth-Plänen während des Trainings und der Evaluation.', 'ko': '우리는 시범에서 층별 전략을 배우는 틀을 제시하고 희소한 자연 언어 주석을 사용하여 자주적인 결정을 지도할 수 있는 중용 기능의 발견을 제시했다.우리는 동작 서열의 생성 모델을 구축했는데 그 중에서 목표는 고급 하위 작업 설명 서열을 생성하고 이런 설명은 저급 동작 서열을 생성한다.우리는 프레젠테이션을 지정한 고급 하위 작업 서열로 해석하고 기본적으로 주석이 없는 프레젠테이션을 사용하여 이 모델을 훈련시키고 소량의 피드 주석만 사용하여 지상 언어를 조작하는 방법을 설명했다.훈련된 모델에서 자연 언어 명령 인덱스 기술 조합 라이브러리;에이전트는 이러한 기술을 이용하여 새로운 목표에 적합한 고급 지령 서열을 생성하여 계획을 세울 수 있다.우리는 알프레도 가정 시뮬레이션 환경에서 이런 방법을 평가했는데, 단지 10퍼센트의 시범에 자연 언어 주석을 제공했다.알프레도의 성공률에 있어서 최첨단 모델과 비슷한 성능을 실현했고 교육과 평가 기간에 지상진상계획을 방문함으로써 최근의 몇 가지 방법보다 성능이 우수했다.', 'fa': 'ما یک چهارچوب برای یادگیری سیاست\u200cهای دایره\u200cآرایشی از نمایش\u200cها را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، با استفاده از نشانه\u200cهای زبان طبیعی کمی برای هدایت کشف مهارت\u200cهای دوباره استفاده می\u200cکنند برای تصمیم\u200cگیری خودکار. ما یک مدل ژنترافی از دستورات عمل را فرمول می\u200cکنیم که هدف\u200cها دستورات زیر سطح بالا تولید می\u200cکنند، و این دستورات دستورات سطح پایین تولید می\u200cکنند. ما توصیف می\u200cکنیم چگونه این مدل را آموزش دهیم با استفاده از نمایش\u200cهای اصلی غیر شناخته با توصیف نمایش\u200cها به دسته\u200cهای زیر کار\u200cهای سطح بالا استفاده می\u200cکنیم، با استفاده تنها تعداد کوچک نوشته\u200cهای دانه به زبان زمین در عمل. در مدل\u200cهای آموزش، فرمان زبان طبیعی یک کتابخانه\u200cی مجموعه مهارت را نشان می\u200cدهد. ماموران می توانند از این مهارت استفاده کنند تا برنامه ریزی کنند با تولید دستورالعمل سطح بالا به هدف های نوی تغییر داده شود. ما این روش را در محیط شبیه\u200cسازی خانواده ALFRED ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، با توجه به زبان طبیعی فقط ۱۰ درصد نمایش\u200cسازی می\u200cدهیم. این مدل\u200cهای قابل مقایسه\u200cای از موفقیت ALFRED را دریافت می\u200cکند که در طول تمرین و ارزیابی چند روش اخیر با دسترسی به نقشه\u200cهای حقیقت زمینی به انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mfumo wa kujifunza sera za kiutawala kutoka kwenye maandamano, kwa kutumia matatizo yasiyo ya lugha asili ili kuonyesha ujuzi unaotumika kwa uamuzi wa kujitegemea. Tunaweza kutengeneza mifano ya kizazi ya mfululizo wa hatua ambapo malengo hayo yanatengeneza mfululizo wa maelezo ya kiwango cha chini ya kazi, na maelezo haya yanasababisha mfululizo wa vitendo vya chini. We describe how to train this model using primarily unannotated demonstrations by parsing demonstrations into sequences of named high-level sub-tasks, using only a small number of seed annotations to ground language in action.  Katika mifano ya mafunzo, lugha ya asili inaamrisha maktaba ya pamoja ya ujuzi; watumiaji wanaweza kutumia ujuzi huu wa kupanga kwa kutengeneza mfululizo wa maelekezo ya juu kwa lengo la riwaya. Tunatathmini mbinu hii katika mazingira ya simulizi ya nyumba ya ALFRED, na kutoa matatizo ya lugha asili kwa asilimia 10 tu ya maandamano. Inafanikiwa utendaji wa mifano inayofanana na hali ya sanaa kuhusu kiwango cha mafanikio cha ALFRED, kutekeleza njia kadhaa za hivi karibuni za kupata mpango wa ukweli wa ardhi wakati wa mafunzo na uchunguzi.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një kuadër për mësimin e politikave hierarkike nga demonstratat, duke përdorur anotacione të pakta gjuhësh natyrore për të udhëzuar zbulimin e aftësive të përdorueshme përsëri për marrjen e vendimeve autonome. Ne formojmë një model gjenerativ të sekuencave veprimi në të cilat objektivat gjenerojnë sekuenca të përshkrimeve të nënpyetjeve të nivelit të lartë, dhe këto përshkrime gjenerojnë sekuenca të veprimeve të nivelit të ulët. Ne përshkruajmë si të trajnojmë këtë model duke përdorur kryesisht demonstracione të papritura duke analizuar demonstracionet në sekuenca të nëndetyrave të emëruara të nivelit të lartë, duke përdorur vetëm një numër të vogël anotacionesh fillimi në gjuhën tokësore në veprim. Në modele të trajnuar, komandat e gjuhës natyrore tregojnë një bibliotekë kombinatore aftësive; agjentët mund të përdorin këto aftësi për të planifikuar duke krijuar sekuenca mësimi të nivelit të lartë të përshtatshme për qëllime të reja. Ne vlerësojmë këtë qasje në mjedisin e simulimit të familjes ALFRED, duke ofruar anotacione natyrore gjuhësh për vetëm 10% të demonstratave. Ajo arrin modele të krahasueshme të renditjes në nivelin e suksesit të ALFRED-it, duke kaluar disa metoda të fundit me akses në planet e të vërtetës tokësore gjatë stërvitjes dhe vlerësimit.', 'tr': 'Biz demonstrasiýalardan iýerarhiýa politikalary öwrenmek üçin bir çerçew görkeýäris, we otonomy karar bermek üçin ýene-de ulanylýan ukyplary tapmak üçin baýramyz dil duýdurýarlar. Biz eylemler arasynda döredici bir modeli çykarýarys. Amaçlar yüksek seviyede altsoru tasvirleri döredir ve bu tasvirler düşük seviyede işlerin sıralarını döredir. Biz bu nusgany ilkinji gezek bilmeýän demonstracijlary ulanyp ýokary dereje-ýokary sub-täblikler diňe ýere-de bir az tarz duýdurmanlary ulanýarys. Edilen nusgalarda, tebigy dil buýruklary birleştirilýän ukyplaryň kitaphany görkez; ajaýyrlar bu ukyplary oňa ýokary dereje guruldyrma dizirlerini döretmek üçin ulanyp bilerler. Biz bu ýagdaýy ALFRED öýüniň simulasyýasynyň çevresinde çykýarys, diňe 10% demonstrasiýa üçin tebigy diller duýdurýarys. Ol ALFRED üstünlik ýüzerinde ýakynlaşyk möhüm nusgalarynyň üstüne çykyp bilýär, okuw we çykyş wagtynda ýerlik dogrylyk planlaryna gol ýetirmekde birnäçe nusgalary çykar.', 'am': 'የአዳራዊ ቋንቋ ማስታወቂያ ፖለቲካዎችን ለመማር ፍሬም እናደርጋለን፡፡ አዲስ የሥርዓት ምርጫዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ይህንን ሞዴል እንዴት እንደሚያስተምር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተማሩ ምሳሌዎች፣ የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋዎች የብሔራዊ ቋንቋ ትእዛዝ የሙቀት ቋንቋዎችን ማሳሰብ ነው፡፡ አካባሮች የደረጃ ትክክለኛውን ትምህርት ግንኙነትን ለመፍጠር ይችላሉ፡፡ ይህንን ሥርዓት በአልፍRED ቤተሰብ ማቀናቀፍ አካባቢ ላይ እናስተውለታለን፡፡ የአልFRED የድል ግንኙነት ላይ የሚተካከለውን የድረ-አርእስት አካባቢ ማድረግ ይደረጋል፤ በአስተማርና በሚያስተምርበት ጊዜ የመሬት-እውነቱን ፕሮግራም ለመግኘት የሚችል ብዙ ሥርዓቶችን ያስተካክላል፡፡', 'af': "Ons stel 'n raamwerk voor die leer van hierarkies beleid van demonstrasies, gebruik sparse natuurlike taal annotasies om die ontdekking van hergebruikbere kunstenaars vir outomatiese besluit te maak. Ons formeer 'n genereerbare model van aksie sekwensies waarin die doels genereer sekwensies van hoë vlak subtvra beskrywings, en hierdie beskrywings genereer sekwensies van lae vlak aksies. Ons beskrywe hoe om hierdie model te trein deur die eerste ongebekende demonstrasie te gebruik deur te parseer demonstrasies in sekwensies van die naamde hoë vlak subtaak, gebruik slegs 'n klein aantal saad notasies na grond taal in aksie. In gevorderde modele, natuurlike taal opdragte indeks 'n kombinasieële biblioteek van kunstenaars; agente kan hierdie verstandighede gebruik om te planeer deur die genereer van hoë vlak instruksie sekwensies wat aan nuwe goale gewys is. Ons evalueer hierdie toegang in die ALFRED huis simulasie omgewing, verskaf natuurlike taal notasies vir net 10% van demonstrasies. Dit bereik effektiviteit vergelykbaar staat van die kunste modele op ALFRED sukses tempo, wat verskeie onlangse metodes uitvoer met toegang tot grond-waarheid planne tydens onderwerp en evaluering.", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք հիերարխիկ քաղաքականության ուսումնասիրելու համակարգ ցուցադրություններից, օգտագործելով հազվադեպ բնական լեզվի նշումներ, որպեսզի ուղղություն ունենանք ինքնաբերական որոշումների կայացման համար վերաօգտագործվող հմտ Մենք ձևավորում ենք գործողության հաջորդականությունների սերունդ, որտեղ նպատակները ստեղծում են բարձր մակարդակի ենթախնդիրների նկարագրությունների հաջորդականություններ, և այս նկարագրությունները ստեղծում են ցածր մակարդակի գործողությունների հաջորդականություններ: Մենք նկարագրում ենք, թե ինչպես վարժեցնել այս մոդելը, օգտագործելով հիմնականում աննկարագրված ցուցադրություններ՝ վերլուծելով ցուցադրությունները կոչված բարձր մակարդակի ենթախնդիրների հաջորդականությամբ, օգտագործելով միայն մի փոքր թվեր սերմնային նոտացիանե Արժեցված մոդելներում բնական լեզվի հրամանները ցույց են տալիս հմտությունների համադրական գրադարան, գործիչները կարող են օգտագործել այս հմտությունները պլանավորելու համար ստեղծելով բարձր մակարդակի ուսուցման հաջորդականություններ, որոնք պատրաստված են նոր նպատակներին: Մենք գնահատում ենք այս մոտեցումը Ալֆրեդ ընտանիքի սիմուլյացիոն միջավայրում, տրամադրելով բնական լեզվի նշումներ ցուցադրությունների միայն 10 տոկոսի համար: Այն հասնում է Ալֆրեդ հաջողության մակարդակի հաջողության համեմատական լավագույն մոդելներին, որոնք գերազանցում են վերջին մի քանի մեթոդներ, որոնք հնարավորություն են տալիս սովորելու և գնահատման ընթացքում հասնել իրականության պլանաներին', 'bn': 'আমরা বিক্ষোভ থেকে হিয়ারার্কিক নীতি শিখার একটি ফ্রেম উপস্থাপন করি, স্বাভাবিক সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণের জন্য স্বাভাবিক ভাষার বিষয়টি প আমরা একটি জেনারেটিভ কার্যকলাপের মডেল তৈরি করি যেখানে লক্ষ্য হাই-স্তরের সাব-কাজের বর্ণনা তৈরি করে এবং এই বর্ণনাগুলো নিম্ন-স্তরের কাজের স আমরা বর্ণনা করি কিভাবে এই মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করতে পারি প্রধান অজানা বিক্ষোভের মাধ্যমে বিক্ষোভ পার্সিং করে উচ্চ স্তরের সাব-কাজে পার্স করে, কেবল কিছ প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার নির্দেশ প্রদান করা হয়েছে দক্ষতার একটি মিনিটেরিয়াল ল লাইব্রে agents can use these skills to plan by generating high-level instruction sequences tailored to novel goals.  আমরা এলাফ্রেড বাড়ির সিমুলেশন পরিবেশে এই পদ্ধতিকে মূল্যায়ন করি, যা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বিক্ষোভের জন্য মাত্র ১০% বিক্ষোভের এটি প্রশিক্ষণ এবং মূল্যায়নের সময় ভূমির সত্য পরিকল্পনার সাম্প্রতিক কিছু পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করেছে।', 'az': 'Biz göstərişlərdən hiyerarşik politikalarını öyrənmək üçün bir çerçive göstəririk, təbiətli dil yazılmalarını istifadə edirik ki, avtomatik karar vermək üçün yenidən istifadə edə biləcək yetkinlik keşfini göstərək. Biz tədbirlərin ən yüksək səviyyə altı soruşma tərzlərini yaratdığı və bu tərzlərin düşük səviyyə eylemlərinin səviyyələrini yaradırır. Biz bu modeli ilk dəfə tanımadıqları demonstrasyon vasitəsilə necə təhsil edəcəyini təsdiqləyirik, bu modeli yüksək səviyyə apa-işlərin seçimlərinə ayırıb, yerdə dillərinə yalnız küçük bir nöqtə dənəm nöqtəsini istifadə edirik. Əlavə edilən modellərdə, təbiətli dil əmrləri birləşdirilmiş yetkinlik kitablarını indiks edir; agentlar bu yetenekləri yeni məqsədilə düzəldilən yüksək səviyyə təsirlərini yaratmaq üçün planlamaq üçün istifadə edə bilər. Biz bu metodları ALFRED evlərin simulasyonu çevresində değerlendiririk, sadəcə 10% göstəricilərin təbiətli dil bildiriciləri təmin edirik. Bu, ALFRED başarısızlıq dərəcəsi ilə müqayisədə müəyyən edilən bir neçə yeni metodların təhsil və değerlendirmək vaxtında yerli-gerçək planlarına istifadə edilməsi ilə müqayisədə müəyyən edilə bilər.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo okvir za učenje hijerarhičke politike iz demonstracija, koristeći rezervne prirodne annotacije kako bi vodili otkriće ponovno korištenih vještina za autonomno donošenje odluka. Formiramo generični model akcijskih sekvencija u kojoj ciljevi stvaraju sekvence opisa podpitanja visokog nivoa, a ovi opisi stvaraju sekvence akcija niskog nivoa. Mi opisujemo kako trenirati ovaj model koristeći primarno neoznačene demonstracije, analizirajući demonstracije u sekvencijama podzadataka na višem nivou, koristeći samo mali broj komentacija sjemena na zemlji jezik u akciji. U obučenim modelima, prirodni jezički zapovijedi indiciraju kombinacijsku biblioteku vještina; agenti mogu iskoristiti te vještine da planiraju stvaranjem sekvencija instrukcija visokog nivoa koji se prilagodi novim ciljevima. Procjenjujemo taj pristup u okruženju simulacije kućanstva ALFRED-a, pružajući prirodne jezičke annotacije samo 10% demonstracija. To postiže usporedbljive modele stanja umjetnosti na stopi uspeha ALFRED-a, koji su iznosili nekoliko nedavnih metoda s pristupom planovima zemaljske istine tijekom obuke i procjene.', 'ca': "Presentam un marc d'aprenentatge de polítiques jeràrquiques a partir de demostracions, fent servir escases anotacions de llenguatge natural per guiar el descobriment de habilitats reutilitzables per a prendre decisions autònoms. Formulem un model generador de seqüències d'acció en què els objectius generen seqüències de descripcions de subtes de alt nivell, i aquestes descripcions generen seqüències d'accions de baix nivell. Descrivem com entrenar aquest model fent servir principalment demostracions sense notar analitzant demostracions en seqüències de subtasques de nivell elevat, fent servir només un petit nombre d'anotacions de semilles al llenguatge terrestre en acció. En models entrenats, els comandos de llenguatge natural indiquen una biblioteca combinatorial de habilitats; els agents poden utilitzar aquestes habilitats per planificar generant seqüències d'ensenyament de alt nivell adaptades a objectius noves. Evaluam aquest enfocament en l'entorn de simulació domèstica ALFRED, proporcionant anotacions de llenguatge natural per només el 10% de les demostracions. Realitza models d'última generació comparables en el ritme d'èxit ALFRED, superant diversos mètodes recents amb accés a plans de veritat terrestre durant l'entrenament i l'evaluació.", 'cs': 'Představujeme rámec pro učení hierarchických politik z demonstrací, pomocí řídkých anotací přirozeného jazyka, které vedou objevování znovu použitelných dovedností pro autonomní rozhodování. Formulujeme generativní model akčních sekvencí, ve kterých cíle generují sekvence popisů podúkolů na vysoké úrovni a tyto popisy generují sekvence akcí na nízké úrovni. Popisujeme, jak tento model trénovat pomocí primárně nezaznamenaných demonstrací parsováním demonstrací do sekvencí pojmenovaných podúloh na vysoké úrovni, pomocí pouze malého počtu seed anotací do základního jazyka v akci. V trénovaných modelech indexují příkazy přirozeného jazyka kombinatorní knihovnu dovedností; Agenti mohou tyto dovednosti využít k plánování generováním vysoké úrovně instrukčních sekvencí přizpůsobených novým cílům. Tento přístup hodnotíme v simulačním prostředí domácnosti ALFRED a poskytujeme anotace přirozeného jazyka pouze pro 10% demonstrací. Dosahuje výkonnosti srovnatelných nejmodernějších modelů na míře úspěšnosti ALFRED, překonává několik nedávných metod s přístupem k základním plánům během školení a hodnocení.', 'et': 'Esitame raamistiku hierarhiliste poliitikate õppimiseks demonstratsioonidest, kasutades hõredaid looduskeelseid märkmeid, et juhtida taaskasutatavate oskuste avastamist autonoomseks otsustamiseks. Me sõnastame generatiivse tegevusjärgude mudeli, kus eesmärgid genereerivad kõrgetasemeliste alaülesannete kirjelduste jadasid ja need kirjeldused genereerivad madala taseme tegevuste jadasid. Kirjeldame, kuidas seda mudelit koolitada, kasutades peamiselt märkimata demonstratsioone, parsides demonstratsioone nimetatud kõrgetasemeliste alamülesannete järjestusteks, kasutades ainult väikest arvu seemnete annotatsioone maapealsele keelele. Koolitatud mudelites indekseerivad looduskeele käsud oskuste kombineeritud kogu; agendid saavad kasutada neid oskusi planeerimiseks, luues uudsete eesmärkide jaoks kohandatud kõrgetasemelisi juhiseid. Hindame seda lähenemisviisi ALFRED kodumajapidamiste simulatsioonikeskkonnas, pakkudes looduskeelseid märkusi vaid 10% demonstratsioonidest. Sellega saavutatakse võrreldavad tipptasemel mudelid ALFREDi edumäära kohta, ületades mitmeid hiljutisi meetodeid, olles koolituse ja hindamise ajal juurdepääs maapealsetele tõeplaanidele.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme kehyksen hierarkkisten käytäntöjen oppimiseen demonstraatioista käyttäen harvoja luonnonkielisiä huomautuksia ohjaamaan uudelleenkäytettävien taitojen löytämistä itsenäiseen päätöksentekoon. Muodostamme generatiivisen toimintamallin, jossa tavoitteet tuottavat sekvenssejä korkean tason alatehtäväkuvauksista, ja nämä kuvaukset tuottavat sekvenssejä matalan tason toimista. Kuvaamme, miten tätä mallia harjoitetaan ensisijaisesti merkitsemättömillä demonstraatioilla jäsentämällä demonstraatioita nimettyjen korkean tason alitehtävien sekvensseiksi käyttäen vain pientä määrää siemenmerkintöjä pohjakieleen toiminnassa. Koulutetuissa malleissa luonnollisen kielen komennot indeksoivat taitojen yhdistelmäkirjaston; Agentit voivat käyttää näitä taitoja suunnittelussa luomalla korkean tason opetusjaksoja, jotka on räätälöity uusiin tavoitteisiin. Arvioimme tätä lähestymistapaa ALFRED-kotitalouksien simulointiympäristössä ja annamme luonnollisen kielen merkinnät vain 10%:lle demonstraatioista. Se saavuttaa suorituskykyyn verrattavissa olevat huipputason mallit ALFRED-onnistumisasteesta, ja se päihittää useita viimeaikaisia menetelmiä, kun sillä on mahdollisuus hyödyntää käytännön suunnitelmia koulutuksen ja arvioinnin aikana.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo kelas akeh hukum sistem ning sarêt, iso nggambar aturan anyar tentang kanggo nggawe gerakan ingkang nggawe aturan sing bisa nguasai perusahaan winih dhéwé. Awak dhéwé nggawe model sing dadi nggawe aksi sekondi sing erawat karo hal-sekondi cara nggawe barang nggawe barang-sekondi, karo akeh basang iki dadi juré sekondi sing beranduh operasi layang-sekondi. Awake dhéwé nggawe modèl iki ngono nggawe diulangno karo mulasar tentang nggawe Attribute ajans iso ngubah perkaran kelas kuwi nggawe ngupakan seneng pisan kelas niune sekondirno sing ngekotak nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerwih bukal. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe balêng-balêr iki ning arep bantêng pancen ning ale mulasar tentang kanggo masara urip sing sabên nggawe 10% kedhéwé. Punika andhados akeh pisan langgar sampuran state-of-the-arts model ning sukuran luwih saben, iso nggawe barang sistem sing berarti ngono kalagayet terus sistem kanggo ngilanggar aturan sing paling nggawe aturan sing paling nggawe aturan karo cah nyong alalayan.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים מסגרת ללמוד מדיניות היררכיות מהדגמות, בשימוש בהערות שפות טבעיות נדירות כדי להדריך את גילוי הכישורים שימשים מחדש לקבלת החלטות אוטונומית. אנו מייצרים מודל דולר של רצפי פעולה שגורמים למטרות לייצר רצפים של תיאורים של רמה גבוהה של תחתונים, והתיאורים האלה מייצרים רצפים של פעולות רמה נמוכה. אנחנו מתארים איך לאמן את המודל הזה בשימוש בעיקר בהדגימות ללא רשומות על ידי חקירת ההדגימות לתוך רצפים של משימות תת-רמה גבוהה בשם, בשימוש רק מספר קטן של הערות זרעים לשפה הקרקעית בפעולה. במודלים מאומנים, פקודות שפת טבעיות מרכיבות ספרייה קומבינטורית של כישורים; agents can use these skills to plan by generating high-level instruction sequences tailored to novel goals.  אנו מעריכים את הגישה הזאת בסביבה של סימולציה הביתית של אלפרד, מספקים ציונים טבעיים לשפה רק ל-10 אחוז מהדגימות. הוא משיג מודלים מצויינים משותפים על שיעור הצלחה של ALFRED, מעלים כמה שיטות לאחרונה עם גישה לתוכניות אמת קרקעית במהלך האימון והערכה.', 'ha': "Tuna samun firam da za'a sanar da siyafan hierrchical daga shekara, don ka yi amfani da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane da za'a iya amfani da su fara ɗaya. Tuna samar da wani misali na zartar da masu aikin aiki, a cikinsa akwai goani ke ƙãga masu sauri na fassarar-duffai masu sarrafa, kuma masu buɗe misãlai masu ƙarai ga aikin aiki. Kana bayyana shi a kan ka sanar da wannan misalin a yi amfani da shi tunkuɗe nunoyi da ba'a sani ba a farko, game da parse da nunoyi zuwa sauri masu bin-aikin da aka suna duffai-daraja, don ka yi amfani da ƙarami kaɗan masu haske cikin zanen zura zuwa lugha bakin aiki. cikin shirin motsi wanda aka sanar da shi, umarnin harshe na natura ke index a littafan littafin da ke koma; masu amfani da waɗannan abinci don su yi kwamfyutan su sami da za'a iya samun shiryarwa masu tsawo da aka danne zuwa goan nan yanzu. Munã ƙaddara wannan hanyarwa a cikin muhallin misalin gidan AlFERD, kuma Munã bãyar da zane-zane cikin harshen asilimin 10 kawai. Yana cika performance mai daidai da halin-sanaren masu sami ga mafaniki na AIFERD, kuma yana samun wasu shiryoyin nan kwanan da za'a iya sami zuwa-bangon gaskiya a lokacin da za'a iya amfani da shiryoyin mafarin da ake ƙayyade.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo okvir za učenje hierarhičnih politik iz demonstracij z uporabo redkih opomb naravnega jezika, ki usmerjajo odkrivanje veščin za ponovno uporabo za avtonomno odločanje. Formuliramo generativni model akcijskih zaporedij, v katerem cilji ustvarjajo zaporedja opisov podopravil na visoki ravni, ti opisi pa ustvarjajo zaporedja akcij na nizki ravni. Opisujemo, kako usposabljati ta model z uporabo predvsem neobvezanih demonstracij z razčlenitvijo demonstracij v zaporedje imenovanih podnalog visoke ravni, z uporabo le majhnega števila semenskih opomb v zemeljski jezik v akciji. V usposobljenih modelih ukazi naravnega jezika indeksirajo kombinatorsko knjižnico spretnosti; agenti lahko te veščine uporabijo za načrtovanje z ustvarjanjem zaporedij navodil na visoki ravni, prilagojenih novim ciljem. Ta pristop ocenjujemo v domačem simulacijskem okolju ALFRED, pri čemer zagotavljamo naravne jezikovne opombe le za 10% demonstracij. Doseže primerljive najsodobnejše modele za stopnjo uspešnosti ALFRED, saj med usposabljanjem in ocenjevanjem presega več novejših metod.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རམས་པའི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྟོན་པར་བྱེད་པའི་མདུན་གཞུང་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། We formulate a generative model of action sequences in which goals generate sequences of high-level subtask descriptions, and these descriptions generate sequences of low-level actions. ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་འདིའི་གོ་སྐབས་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་མི་འདུག སྣ་གཟུགས་ཅན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ནང་དུ་natural language commands index a combinatorial library of skills; aja་ པ་ཚོས་མཐུན་རྩལ་འདི་དག་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུན་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གྱི་གོ་རིམ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་ALFRED ནང་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཏོང་གཏ It achieves performance comparable state-of-the-art models on ALFRED success rate, outperforming several recent methods with access to ground-truth plans during training and evaluation.'}
{'en': 'Interpretability for Language Learners Using Example-Based Grammatical Error Correction', 'ar': '{F} ully- {S} emantic {P} arsing and {G} eneration: the {B} abel {N} et {M} eaning {R} epresentation', 'pt': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing e {G}neration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}significado {R}epresentation', 'es': '{F} generación {S} semántica completa {P} y {G}: la etiqueta {B} {N} et {M} que significa {R} representación', 'fr': "{F} entièrement- {S} génération {P} sémantique et {G}\xa0: l'étiquette {B} {N} et {M} signifiant {R} représentation", 'hi': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing और {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ru': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ja': '{F} ully -{ S} emantic {P} arsing and {G} eneration: the {B} abel {N} et {M} eaning {R} epresentation', 'zh': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration： the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ga': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing agus {G}ghiniúint: an {B}abel{N}et {M}léiriú {R}', 'ka': '{B}abel{N} და {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'el': '(F}ολότελα-{S}Emantic {P}arsing and {G}generation: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}representation', 'hu': '{F}teljesen-{S}emantikus {P}arsing és {G}generáció: a {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}reprezentáció', 'it': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G} generation: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}', 'kk': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P} arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N} and {M} eaning {R}epresentation', 'lt': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ms': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ml': 'പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mk': 'Емантично запалување и енерација', 'mt': '{F}full-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'no': '{F}ully -{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'pl': '{F}całkowicie-{S}emantyczne {P}palenie i {G}generacja: reprezentacja {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}', 'sr': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N} and {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'mn': '{B}abel{N} {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ro': '{F}complet-{S}emantic {P}arsing şi {G}generaţie: reprezentanţa {B}abel{N}şi {M}eaning {R}', 'so': 'Macallin', 'si': '{0}පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': '{F}fullständigt-{S}emantisk {P}arsing och {G}generation: den {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}', 'ta': 'முன்னிருப்பு', 'ur': 'from {album} by {artist}" type string, and {1} is the "on {radio station name}', 'uz': 'Ekran', 'vi': 'Đơn yêu cầu của anh! Yêu cầu! Yêu cầu! Yêu cầu! Xin chào!', 'bg': '{F} напълно- емантично {P} arsing и {G} генерация: представянето на {B} абел{N} и {M}eaning {R}', 'da': '{F}fuldt-{S}emantisk {P}arsing og {G} generation: den {B}abel{N}et {M} eaning {R}', 'hr': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneracija: the {B}abel{N} and {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'nl': '(F}volledig-{S}emantische {P}arsing en {G}generatie: de {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}representatie', 'de': '(F}voll-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}generation: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}repräsentation', 'id': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ko': '{F}ully-{S}emantic{P}생성 및 {G}생성 {B}abel{N}et{M}표시 {R}', 'fa': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}', 'sw': 'Tamko', 'tr': 'from {album} by {artist}" type string, and {1} is the "on {radio station name}', 'af': '{F}ully -{S}emantic {P} arsing en {G}enerasie: die {B}abel{N} en {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'sq': 'P ërsëritje', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'The', 'az': '{B}abel{N} et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধি', 'bs': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N} and {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'ca': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}representation', 'cs': '{F}plně-{S}emantické {P}žhání a {G}generace: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}reprezentace', 'et': '{F}täielikult-{S}emantiline {P}arsing ja {G}generatsioon: esindus {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}', 'fi': '{F}täysin-{S}emanttinen {P}arsing ja {G}generaatio: B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}', 'jv': 'from {album}by {radio station name}', 'ha': 'G õdiya', 'he': '{F}ully-{S}emantic {P}arsing and {G}eneration: the {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}epresentation', 'sk': '{F}popolnoma-{S}emantično {P}arsing in {G}generacija: predstavitev {B}abel{N}et {M}eaning {R}', 'bo': 'from {album} by {artist}" type string, and {1} is the "on {radio station name}'}
{'en': 'Grammatical Error Correction (GEC) should not focus only on high accuracy of corrections but also on interpretability for language learning.However, existing neural-based GEC models mainly aim at improving accuracy, and their interpretability has not been explored.A promising approach for improving interpretability is an example-based method, which uses similar retrieved examples to generate corrections. In addition, examples are beneficial in language learning, helping learners understand the basis of grammatically incorrect/correct texts and improve their confidence in writing.Therefore, we hypothesize that incorporating an example-based method into GEC can improve interpretability as well as support language learners.In this study, we introduce an Example-Based GEC (EB-GEC) that presents examples to language learners as a basis for a correction result.The examples consist of pairs of correct and incorrect sentences similar to a given input and its predicted correction.Experiments demonstrate that the examples presented by EB-GEC help language learners decide to accept or refuse suggestions from the GEC output.Furthermore, the experiments also show that retrieved examples improve the accuracy of corrections.', 'ar': 'يعد تمثيل المعنى المستقل عن اللغة أحد أكثر الأحلام المرغوبة في فهم اللغة الطبيعية. مع وضع هذا الهدف في الاعتبار ، تم اقتراح العديد من الشكليات كأطر لتمثيل المعنى في التحليل الدلالي. ومع ذلك ، فإن التبعيات التي تشترك فيها هذه الأشكال الشكلية فيما يتعلق بمستودعات المعرفة الخاصة باللغة تجعل هدف سد الفجوة بين اللغات عالية ومنخفضة الموارد أمرًا صعبًا. في هذا البحث ، نقدم تمثيل BabelNet المعنى (BMR) ، وهو شكلية بين اللغات تتخلص من قيود اللغة المحددة من خلال الاستفادة من الموارد الدلالية متعددة اللغات في BabelNet و VerbAtlas. نصف الأساس المنطقي وراء إنشاء BMR وطرحنا BMR 1.0 ، وهي مجموعة بيانات مصنفة بالكامل وفقًا للشكلية الجديدة. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر كيف أن BMR قادر على التفوق في الأداء على الشكليات السابقة بفضل تأطيرها الدلالي بالكامل ، والذي يتيح تحليل وتوليد متعدد اللغات على أعلى مستوى. أصدرنا الكود على https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'fr': "Une représentation du sens indépendante de la langue est l'un des rêves les plus convoités de la compréhension du langage naturel. Dans cette optique, plusieurs formalismes ont été proposés comme cadres pour la représentation des significations dans l'analyse sémantique. Et pourtant, les dépendances que ces formalismes partagent par rapport aux référentiels de connaissances spécifiques à une langue rendent difficile la réalisation de l'objectif de combler l'écart entre les langues à ressources élevées et faibles. Dans cet article, nous présentons le BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), un formalisme interlinguistique qui fait abstraction des contraintes spécifiques à la langue en tirant parti des ressources sémantiques multilingues de BabelNet et VeraTLAS. Nous décrivons la raison d'être de la création de BMR et proposons BMR 1.0, un ensemble de données entièrement étiqueté selon le nouveau formalisme. De plus, nous montrons comment BMR est capable de surpasser les formalismes précédents grâce à son cadrage entièrement sémantique, qui permet une analyse et une génération multilingues de premier ordre. Nous publions le code à l'adresse https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'pt': 'Uma representação de significado independente da linguagem é um dos sonhos mais cobiçados em Compreensão da Linguagem Natural. Com este objetivo em mente, vários formalismos têm sido propostos como frameworks para a representação de significados na Análise Semântica. E, no entanto, as dependências que esses formalismos compartilham com relação aos repositórios de conhecimento específicos da linguagem tornam difícil alcançar o objetivo de fechar a lacuna entre linguagens de alto e baixo recursos. Neste artigo, apresentamos a Representação de Significado BabelNet (BMR), um formalismo interlingual que se abstrai das restrições específicas da linguagem, aproveitando os recursos semânticos multilíngues de BabelNet e VerbAtlas. Descrevemos a lógica por trás da criação do BMR e apresentamos o BMR 1.0, um conjunto de dados rotulado inteiramente de acordo com o novo formalismo. Além disso, mostramos como o BMR é capaz de superar formalismos anteriores graças ao seu enquadramento totalmente semântico, que permite análise e geração multilíngues de alto nível. Liberamos o código em https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'es': 'Una representación del significado independiente del idioma es uno de los sueños más codiciados en la comprensión del lenguaje natural. Con este objetivo en mente, se han propuesto varios formalismos como marcos para la representación del significado en el análisis semántico. Sin embargo, las dependencias que estos formalismos comparten con respecto a los depósitos de conocimiento específicos del idioma hacen que sea difícil lograr el objetivo de cerrar la brecha entre los idiomas de recursos altos y bajos. En este artículo, presentamos BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), un formalismo interlingüístico que abstrae las limitaciones específicas del idioma aprovechando los recursos semánticos multilingües de BabelNet y VerbAtlas. Describimos las razones detrás de la creación de BMR y presentamos BMR 1.0, un conjunto de datos etiquetado completamente de acuerdo con el nuevo formalismo. Además, mostramos cómo BMR es capaz de superar los formalismos anteriores gracias a su encuadre totalmente semántico, que permite el análisis y la generación multilingüe de primer nivel. Publicamos el código en https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ja': '意味の言語に依存しない表現は、自然言語理解における最も切望される夢の1つです。 この目標を念頭に置いて、意味論的解析における意味表現の枠組みとしていくつかの形式論が提案されている。 しかしながら、これらの形式主義が言語固有の知識リポジトリに関して共有する依存関係は、高リソース言語と低リソース言語の間のギャップを埋めるという目的を達成することを困難にしている。 本稿では、BabelNetとVerbAtlasの多言語セマンティックリソースを活用して、言語固有の制約から抽象化する言語間形式主義であるBabelNet Meaning Representation （ BMR ）を提示する。 BMRの作成の根拠を説明し、完全に新しい形式主義に従ってラベル付けされたデータセットであるBMR 1.0を提案します。 さらに、BMRが以前のフォーマリズムを上回ることができるのは、完全にセマンティックなフレームワークのおかげです。これにより、一流の多言語解析と生成が可能になります。 コードはhttps://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmrからリリースされます。', 'zh': '语言无关意自然语言最是垂涎梦。 念此,已发数形式主义以为语义解析义之框架。 然形式主义于特定言之知识库所共享者,使缩小高资言语低资源相去难得也。 本文中,发BabelNet义以示(BMR),此跨语形式主义,因BabelNetVerbAtlas多语义资,抽特定于言语之约束也。 述创BMR背之基本原理,并建BMR 1.0,此一据新形式主义标记之数集也。 展示BMR何以越前形式主义,归功于全语义之框架,以成一流之言解析成矣。 发代码于 https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr 。', 'ru': 'Независимое от языка представление смысла - одна из самых желанных мечтаний в Понимании Естественного Языка. С учетом этой цели было предложено несколько формализмов в качестве рамок для представления смысла в семантическом парсинге. И тем не менее, зависимости, которые эти формализмы разделяют в отношении конкретных языковых хранилищ знаний, затрудняют достижение цели сокращения разрыва между языками с высоким и низким объемом ресурсов. В этой статье мы представляем BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), межязычный формализм, который абстрагируется от языковых ограничений, используя преимущества многоязычных семантических ресурсов BabelNet и VerbAtlas. Мы описываем обоснование создания BMR и выдвигаем BMR 1.0, набор данных, маркированный полностью в соответствии с новым формализмом. Более того, мы показываем, как BMR способен превзойти предыдущие формализмы благодаря своему полностью семантическому фреймированию, которое обеспечивает первоклассный многоязычный синтаксический анализ и генерацию. Мы выпускаем код по адресу https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'hi': 'अर्थ का एक भाषा-स्वतंत्र प्रतिनिधित्व प्राकृतिक भाषा समझ में सबसे प्रतिष्ठित सपनों में से एक है। इस लक्ष्य को ध्यान में रखते हुए, कई औपचारिकताओं को सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग में अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए ढांचे के रूप में प्रस्तावित किया गया है। और फिर भी, ज्ञान की भाषा-विशिष्ट भंडारों के संबंध में इन औपचारिकताओं को साझा करने वाली निर्भरताएं उच्च और निम्न-संसाधन वाली भाषाओं के बीच की खाई को पूरा करने के लिए कठिन बनाती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम BabelNet अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (BMR) प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक अंतरभाषी औपचारिकता जो बेबेलनेट और VerbAtlas के बहुभाषी शब्दार्थ संसाधनों का लाभ उठाकर भाषा-विशिष्ट बाधाओं से दूर हो जाती है। हम बीएमआर के निर्माण के पीछे के तर्क का वर्णन करते हैं और बीएमआर 1.0 को आगे बढ़ाते हैं, एक डेटासेट जो पूरी तरह से नई औपचारिकता के अनुसार लेबल किया गया है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि बीएमआर अपनी पूरी तरह से शब्दार्थ फ्रेमिंग के लिए पिछले औपचारिकताओं को कैसे मात देने में सक्षम है, जो शीर्ष-पायदान बहुभाषी पार्सिंग और पीढ़ी को सक्षम बनाता है। हम https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr पर कोड जारी करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá léiriú teanga-neamhspleách ar an bhrí ar cheann de na brionglóidí is comaoineach i dTuisceana Teanga Nádúrtha. Agus an sprioc seo á chur san áireamh, tá roinnt foirmiúlachtaí molta mar chreataí le haghaidh léiriú brí sa Pharsáil Shéimeantach. Mar sin féin, de bharr na spleáchais atá ag na foirmiúlachtaí seo maidir le stórtha eolais a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga, is deacair an cuspóir an bhearna idir teangacha ardacmhainní agus teangacha ísle a dhúnadh a bhaint amach. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid Léiriú Brí BabelNet (BMR) i láthair, foirmiúlacht idirtheangach a shíneann ar shiúl ó shrianta a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga trí leas a bhaint as acmhainní shéimeantacha ilteangacha BabelNet agus VerbAtlas. Déanaimid cur síos ar an réasúnaíocht atá taobh thiar de chruthú BMR agus cuirimid BMR 1.0 chun cinn, tacar sonraí atá lipéadaithe go hiomlán de réir na foirmiúlachta nua. Ina theannta sin, léirímid conas atá BMR in ann feidhmiú níos fearr ná foirmiúlachtaí roimhe seo a bhuíochas dá fhrámaíocht shéimeantach iomlán, a chumasaíonn parsáil agus giniúint ilteangach den scoth. Scaoilimid an cód ag https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'el': 'Μια γλωσσική ανεξάρτητη αναπαράσταση του νοήματος είναι ένα από τα πιο περιζήτητα όνειρα στην κατανόηση της φυσικής γλώσσας. Με αυτόν τον στόχο, έχουν προταθεί διάφοροι φορμαλισμοί ως πλαίσια για την αναπαράσταση εννοιών στη Σημαντική Ανάλυση. Ωστόσο, οι εξαρτήσεις που μοιράζονται αυτοί οι φορμαλισμοί σε σχέση με τα γλωσσικά αποθετήρια γνώσης καθιστούν δύσκολο να επιτευχθεί ο στόχος να κλείσει το χάσμα μεταξύ γλωσσών υψηλών και χαμηλών πόρων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε τη σημασιολογική αναπαράσταση ενός γλωσσολογικού φορμαλισμού που αφαιρεί μακριά από γλωσσικούς περιορισμούς αξιοποιώντας τους πολύγλωσσους σημασιολογικούς πόρους του και του VerbAtlas. Περιγράφουμε τη λογική πίσω από τη δημιουργία του BMR και προτείνουμε το BMR 1.0, ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που επισημαίνεται εξ ολοκλήρου σύμφωνα με τον νέο φορμαλισμό. Επιπλέον, δείχνουμε πώς η BMR είναι σε θέση να ξεπεράσει τους προηγούμενους φορμαλισμούς χάρη στην πλήρως σημασιολογική πλαισίωση της, η οποία επιτρέπει την κορυφαία ανάλυση και παραγωγή πολύγλωσσων γλωσσών. Θα απελευθερώσουμε τον κωδικό στο https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'hu': 'A jelentés nyelvfüggetlen ábrázolása a természetes nyelv megértésének egyik legáhítottabb álma. Ezzel a céllal szem előtt tartva számos formalizmust javasoltak a szemantikus értelmezésben való ábrázolás kereteként. És mégis azok a függőségek, amelyeket ezek a formalizmusok megosztanak a nyelvspecifikus tudástárakkal kapcsolatban, nehéz megvalósítani a nagy és alacsony forrású nyelvek közötti szakadékot. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), egy nyelvközi formalizmust, amely a BabelNet és a VerbAtlas többnyelvű szemantikai erőforrásainak kihasználásával elvonja a nyelvspecifikus korlátozásoktól. A BMR létrehozásának indokait ismertetjük és előterjesztjük a BMR 1.0-t, egy teljes egészében az új formalizmus szerint feliratozott adatkészletet. Megmutatjuk továbbá, hogy a BMR hogyan képes felülmúlni a korábbi formalizmusokat a teljes szemantikus keretezésének köszönhetően, amely lehetővé teszi a legjobb többnyelvű elemzést és generálást. Kiadjuk a kódot a https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელობის სახელის სახელის განსაზღვრება არის ერთი ნაი-მნიშვნელოვანი ძნობების ნახელის სახელის განსხვავებაში. ამ მიზემის შესახებ, რამდენიმე ფორმატიკური პროგრამები იყენება როგორც ფრამები, როგორც ნიშნავს სემონტიკური პროგრამებში. და მაგრამ, ამ ფორმალიზმის განსაკუთრებულობები ცოდნიერების რეპოზიციების განსაკუთრებულობაზე გაყოფილი განსაკუთრებულობების მიხედვით, რომ უფრო ძალიან გადახურება მარტივი და მარტივი რესურსურსურ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ BabelNet-ს განსაზღვრებული რესპეცენტაცია (BMR), ინტერლუგური ფორმალიზმი, რომელიც ენის განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც BabelNet და VerbAtlas-ის მრავალენგური სმენტიკური რესურსის გამოყ ჩვენ BMR-ის შექმნა და BMR 1.0-ის შემდეგ დავწერეთ პარაციონალის შესახებ, მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც ახალი ფორმალიზმის შესახებ დავწერეთ. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ვიჩვენებთ, როგორ BMR შეუძლია წინა ფორმალიზმისთვის გავაკეთოთ, რომელიც უფრო სემონტიკური ფრამისთვის, რომელიც მრავალენგური პარალიზმის და დავი ჩვენ კოდის გახსნა https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'it': "Una rappresentazione indipendente dal linguaggio del significato è uno dei sogni più ambiti nella comprensione del linguaggio naturale. Con questo obiettivo in mente, diversi formalismi sono stati proposti come framework per la rappresentazione del significato nel Parsing Semantic. Eppure, le dipendenze che questi formalismi condividono rispetto ai repository di conoscenza specifici del linguaggio rendono difficile da realizzare l'obiettivo di colmare il divario tra lingue ad alta e bassa risorsa. In questo articolo presentiamo BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), un formalismo interlinguistico che astrae dai vincoli linguistici specifici sfruttando le risorse semantiche multilingue di BabelNet e VerbAtlas. Descriviamo la logica dietro la creazione di BMR e presentiamo BMR 1.0, un dataset etichettato interamente secondo il nuovo formalismo. Inoltre, mostriamo come BMR sia in grado di superare i formalismi precedenti grazie al suo framing completamente semantico, che consente l'analisi e la generazione multilingue di altissimo livello. Rilasciamo il codice a https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'lt': 'Savarankiškas reikšmės atstovavimas kalba yra vienas iš labiausiai troškiamų sapnų gamtinės kalbos supratimo srityje. With this goal in mind, several formalisms have been proposed as frameworks for meaning representation in Semantic Parsing.  Vis dėlto dėl šių formalumų priklausomybės konkrečiai kalbai skirtų žinių saugyklų sunku pasiekti tikslą užkirsti kelią atotrūkiui tarp didelių ir mažai išteklių turinčių kalbų. Šiame dokumente pristatome BabelNet reikšmės atstovavimą (BMR), tarpkalbinį formalumą, kuris atsitraukia nuo konkrečiai kalbai būdingų apribojimų, pasinaudojant daugiakalbiais semantiniais BabelNet ir VerbAtlas ištekliais. Apibrėžiame BMR sukūrimo pagrindą ir siūlome BMR 1.0, duomenų rinkinį, pažymėtą visiškai pagal naują formalumą. Be to, rodome, kaip BMR gali viršyti ankstesnius formalumus, nes jis yra visiškai semantinis, kuris leidžia daugiakalbį analizavimą ir kartą. Mes išleidžiame kodą https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'kk': 'Тілден тәуелсіз мәліметті таңдау - табиғи тілді түсініктерінің ең көңіл армандарының бірі. Бұл мақсатты ойлау үшін, Semantic Parsing дегенде бірнеше офилизмдік деңгейі ретінде қолданылады. Бірақ бұл офилизмдердің тәуелсіздігі білім репозиторияларына қатынасыз болып тұрған тілдердің жоғары мен төмен ресурстар арасындағы аралығын жабу мақсаты болады. Бұл қағазда, BabelNet мәліметті презентациясын (BMR) таңдаймыз. Бұл тілді ерекше шектеулерден қашықтық көп тілді бебелNet және VerbAtlas көптілікті семантикалық ресурстарды қолдануға арналған межтілдік формализмі. Біз BMR құрылысының артындағы рационализацияны таңдап, BMR 1. 0 дегенді жіберіп, жаңа офилизмдікке сәйкес белгіленген деректер жиынын таңдадық. Осыдан қатар, BMR алдыңғы офилизмдерді толық семантикалық фрейміне көмектесу және жасау мүмкіндігіне көмектесетінін көрсетеді. Кодты басып шығару https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ms': 'A language-independent representation of meaning is one of the most coveted dreams in Natural Language Understanding.  Dengan tujuan ini dalam fikiran, beberapa formalisme telah diusulkan sebagai bingkai untuk mewakili makna dalam penghuraian Semantic. Namun, dependensi-dependensi formalisme ini berkongsi terhadap repositori pengetahuan khusus bahasa membuat tujuan untuk menutup ruang antara bahasa yang mempunyai sumber tinggi dan rendah sukar untuk dilakukan. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Perwakilan Maksud BabelNet (BMR), formalisme antar-bahasa yang menjauhkan dari keterangan-keterangan bahasa secara khusus dengan mengambil keuntungan sumber semantik berbilang-bahasa BabelNet dan VerbAtlas. Kami menggambarkan alasan di belakang ciptaan BMR dan melanjutkan BMR 1.0, set data yang ditabel sepenuhnya mengikut formalisme baru. Selain itu, kita menunjukkan bagaimana BMR mampu melampaui formalisme terdahulu berkat bingkai sepenuhnya semantik, yang membolehkan penghuraian dan generasi berbagai bahasa tertinggi. Kita lepaskan kod di https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjoni ta’ tifsira indipendenti mil-lingwa hija waħda mill-ħolm l-aktar imħasseb fil-fehim tal-lingwa naturali. With this goal in mind, several formalisms have been proposed as frameworks for meaning representation in Semantic Parsing.  U madankollu, id-dipendenzi li dawn il-formaliżmi jaqsmu fir-rigward tar-repożitorji tal-għarfien speċifiċi għall-lingwa jagħmlu l-għan li jingħalaq id-distakk bejn lingwi b’riżorsi għoljin u b’riżorsi baxxi diffiċli biex jintlaħaq. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw ir-Rappreżentanza tat-Tip tal-BabelNet (BMR), formaliżmu interlingwistiku li jastratti ’l bogħod minn restrizzjonijiet speċifiċi għall-lingwa billi nużaw ir-riżorsi semantiċi multilingwistiċi ta’ BabelNet u VerbAtlas. Aħna niddeskrivu r-raġunament wara l-ħolqien tal-BMR u ressqu l-BMR 1.0, sett ta’ dejta ttikkettat kompletament skont il-formaliżmu l-ġdid. Barra minn hekk, nistgħu nuru kif il-BMR huwa kapaċi jwettaq formaliżmi preċedenti bis-saħħa tal-qafas kompletament semantiku tiegħu, li jippermetti l-analiżi u l-ġenerazzjoni multilingwi tal-ogħla livell. Aħna nħelsu l-kodiċi fuq https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാഷ ഭാഷയിലെ ഏറ്റവും ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന സ്വപ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരാളാണ് ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത്. ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളായി പല ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200dമാന എന്നിട്ടും ഈ ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200dമിലിസ്മുകളുടെ ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, അറിവിന്റെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച റിപോസിറ്ററികള്\u200dക്ക് പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, അതിന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബാബെല്\u200dനെറ്റിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. ബെബെല്\u200dനെറ്റിന്റെയും വെര്\u200dബാറ്റ്ലാസിന്റെയും പല ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d BMR സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പിന്നിലുള്ള വ്യവസ്ഥയെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുകയും, BMR 1.0 മുന്\u200dപോട്ട് വെക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. പു Moreover, we show how BMR is able to outperform previous formalisms thanks to its fully-semantic framing, which enables top-notch multilingual parsing and generation.  നമ്മള്\u200d കോഡിനെ വിട്ടുകളയുന്നു https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'mk': 'A language-independent representation of meaning is one of the most coveted dreams in Natural Language Understanding.  Со оглед на оваа цел, неколку формализми се предложени како рамки за значење претставување во семантичното анализирање. И сепак, зависностите што овие формализми ги споделуваат во однос на јазичните резервоари на знаење ја прави целта да се затвори празнината помеѓу јазиците со високи и ниски ресурси тешко да се оствари. Во овој весник, ја претставуваме Претставата за значење на BabelNet (БМР), меѓујазичниот формализам кој апстрактира од јазичките конкретни ограничувања со искористување на мултијазичните семантични ресурси на BabelNet и VerbAtlas. Ја опишуваме рационалната причина зад создавањето на БМР и предложуваме БМР 1.0, компјутер на податоци целосно означен според новиот формализам. Покрај тоа, покажуваме како БМР може да ги надмине претходните формализами благодарение на целосно семантичното рамка, што овозможува највисока мултијазичка анализа и генерација. Го ослободиме кодот на https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'pl': 'Niezależna od języka reprezentacja znaczenia jest jednym z najbardziej pożądanych marzeń w rozumieniu języka naturalnego. W tym celu zaproponowano kilka formalizmów jako ramy reprezentacji znaczeń w Parsowaniu Semantycznym. A jednak zależności te formalizmy łączą w odniesieniu do specyficznych dla języka repozytoriów wiedzy sprawiają, że cel zmniejszenia luki między językami o wysokich i niskich zasobach jest trudny do osiągnięcia. W artykule przedstawiamy BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), formalizm międzyjęzyczny, który abstrahuje od ograniczeń specyficznych dla języka poprzez wykorzystanie wielojęzycznych zasobów semantycznych BabelNet i VerbAtlas. Opisujemy uzasadnienie powstania BMR i przedstawiamy BMR 1.0, zbiór danych oznaczony całkowicie zgodnie z nowym formalizmem. Ponadto pokazujemy, w jaki sposób BMR jest w stanie przewyższyć poprzednie formalizmy dzięki w pełni semantycznemu framingowi, który umożliwia najwyższej klasy parsowanie i generowanie wielojęzyczne. Wydajemy kod pod adresem: https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэн хэл-ээс хамааралтай утгатай үзүүлэлт бол байгалийн хэл ойлголтын хамгийн хүсэлтэй мөрөөдөлдөөн нэг юм. Энэ зорилго санаанд хэд хэдэн официализм нь Semantic Parsing-д үзүүлэх утгыг илэрхийлэх хэмжээсүүд гэж санал болсон. Гэхдээ эдгээр официализмын хамаарал нь мэдлэгийн хэлний тодорхой хадгаламжтай холбогдол нь өндөр болон бага хадгаламжтай хэлний хоорондын ялгааг зогсоох зорилго болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид BabelNet-ийн утгатай суралцагч (BMR), хэлний тодорхой хязгаарлалтаас алдагдаж буй интервал хэлний төлөвлөгөө, BabelNet болон VerbAtlas-ын олон хэлний semantic эх үүсвэрүүдийг ашиглаж байна. Бид BMR-ын бүтээлтийн ард байгаа шалтгааныг тайлбарлаж, BMR 1.0-г илгээж, шинэ официализм руу бүрэн нэрлэгдсэн өгөгдлийн санг тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн бид BMR нь өмнөх официализмыг хэрхэн хийж чадна вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь олон хэлний хуваалцах болон үеийнх боломжтой. Бид кодыг https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ro': 'O reprezentare independentă de limbă a semnificației este unul dintre cele mai râvnite vise în înțelegerea limbajului natural. Cu acest scop în minte, mai multe formalisme au fost propuse ca cadre pentru reprezentarea semnificației în Parsing Semantic. Și totuși, dependențele pe care aceste formalisme le împărtășesc cu privire la depozitele de cunoștințe specifice limbii fac obiectivul de a elimina decalajul dintre limbile cu resurse mari și cu resurse reduse greu de realizat. În această lucrare, prezentăm BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), un formalism interlingvistic care abstracționează de constrângerile specifice limbajului, profitând de resursele semantice multilingve ale BabelNet și VerbAtlas. Descriem rațiunea din spatele creării BMR și propunem BMR 1.0, un set de date etichetat în întregime conform noului formalism. Mai mult decât atât, arătăm cum BMR este capabilă să depășească formalismele anterioare datorită cadrului său complet semantic, care permite analizarea și generarea multilingvă de top. Eliberăm codul la https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'no': 'Eit språk-uavhengig representasjon av mening er ein av dei mest ønskte drømmene i naturspråk forståking. Med dette målet har fleire formalismar blitt foreslått som rammeverk for betydning i semantisk tolking. Og likevel, avhengigheten av desse formalismene deler med respekt til språk-spesifikke lager av kunnskap gjer målet å lukka avstanden mellom høg og låg ressursert språk vanskeleg å fullføra. I denne papiret presenterer vi BabelNet-meaningRepresentasjonen (BMR), eit interspråksformalism som abstraktar vekk frå språksspesifikke begrensningar ved å bruka nytte av de fleirspråkssemantiske ressursane i BabelNet og VerbAtlas. Vi beskriver rasjonen bak opprettinga av BMR og legg fram BMR 1.0, eit datasett som er merket fullstendig etter den nye formalismen. I tillegg viser vi korleis BMR kan utføra tidlegare formalismar, takk på fullstendig semantisk ramme, som gjer det mogleg å tolka og generera fleirspråk. Vi løyser koden på https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'sr': 'Jedna od najželjenijih snova u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. S ovim ciljem na umu, predloženo je nekoliko formalizma kao okvira za smisao predstavljanja u semantičkom razmatranju. A ipak, ovisnosti ovih formalizma podijele u pogledu registracija znanja na jezik specifičnih znanja čine cilj zatvaranja praznina između visokih i niskih izvora jezika teško postići. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Međujezički formalizam BabelNet-a (BMR), koji se odvaja od ograničenja jezika specifičnih jezika koristeći mnogijezičke semantičke resurse BabelNet i VerbAtlasa. Mi opisujemo racional iza stvaranja BMR-a i predstavljamo BMR 1.0, komplet podataka označen potpuno prema novom formalizmu. Osim toga, pokazujemo kako BMR može izvršiti prethodne formalizme zahvaljujući svom potpuno semantičkom okviru, što omogućava vrhunsku multijezičku analizu i generaciju. Puštamo šifru. https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'si': 'භාෂාවක් ස්වතංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් තේරුම් කිරීම තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න මේ අදහසක් මතකයේ තියෙන්නේ, සෙමාන්ටික් පාර්සින්ග් වලට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය විදිහට විශේෂ කරලා තියෙනවා. ඒ වගේම, මේ සාධාරණාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් භාෂාත්මක විශේෂ භාෂාත්මක සංවිධානය සමඟ සංවිධානය කරනවා මුළු භාෂාවක් අ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි BabelNet අදහස් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන (BMR), බාබෙල්නෙට් වලින් භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරතිභාවිතයෙන්, භාෂාවික විශේෂ සීමාන්තික ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විශ අපි BMR නිර්මාණයේ පිටිපස්සේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය විස්තර කරනවා BMR 1.0 විස්තර කරනවා, අළුත් සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරයෙන් තොරතුරු සැ තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ BMR කොහොමද කලින් ප්\u200dරධාන ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරධාන ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ස්තූති අපි කෝඩ් එක නිදහස් කරනවා. https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'sv': 'En språkoberoende representation av mening är en av de mest eftertraktade drömmarna inom Natural Language Understanding. Med detta mål i åtanke har flera formalismer föreslagits som ramar för betydelserepresentation i semantisk tolkning. Och ändå gör de beroenden som dessa formalismer delar med avseende på språkspecifika kunskapsförråd målet att överbrygga klyftan mellan språk med hög och låg resurs svårt att uppnå. I denna uppsats presenterar vi BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), en mellanspråklig formalism som abstraherar bort från språkspecifika begränsningar genom att utnyttja de flerspråkiga semantiska resurserna i BabelNet och VerbAtlas. Vi beskriver motiven bakom skapandet av BMR och lade fram BMR 1.0, ett dataset helt märkt enligt den nya formalismen. Dessutom visar vi hur BMR kan överträffa tidigare formalismer tack vare sin helt semantiska framning, vilket möjliggör förstklassig flerspråkig tolkning och generering. Vi släpper koden vid https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'so': 'Mid ka mid ah riyooyin ugu xiisooday afka asalka ah waxgarashada afka asalka ah. Markaas waxaa lagu talo galay, waxaa loo soo jeeday wax badan oo rasmi ah oo loogu talo galay wakiilka jardiinada Semantic. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, waxay ku xiran tahay rasmigaas oo ku saabsan kooxaha aqoonta ee luqada cayiman waxay ka dhigaan dhamaadka kala duwan luqadaha sare iyo kuwa nooca badan in ay ku dhamaado si aad u adag. Warqadan, waxaynu soo bandhignaa BabelNet macnaheedka (BMR), taas oo ah qaab kala duduwan oo ka soocsada xadhigyada luuqadaha gaarka ah ee ku isticmaalaya rasmiga kala duduwan ee BabelNet iyo VerbAtlas. Waxaynu sawiraynaa rasmiga ka dambeeya abuuridda BMR 1.0, taas oo lagu qoray dhamaantood si waafaqsan qaabkii cusub. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaa sida BMR u awoodi karo in uu horay u sameyn karo qaab horumar ah, waxaana ku mahad naqayaa dhaqankiisa oo dhan semanti, taasoo suurtagal ka dhigi kara baaritaanka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Waxaynu furaynaa sumadda https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ta': 'ஒரு மொழி சுதந்திரமான பிரதிநிதித்தல் என்பது இயல்பான மொழி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் மிகவும் விரும்பிய கனவுகளில இந்த இலக்கை மனதில், பல வடிவமைப்புகள் செமாண்டிக் பாசிங்கில் பிரதிநிதிப்புகளுக்கு சட்டத்தில் பரிந்துரைக்கப் ஆனாலும், இந்த வடிவமைப்புகள் சார்ந்தது, அறிவின் குறிப்பிட்ட அறிவின் கிடங்குகளை பற்றி இந்த மொழிகளின் சார்ந்தது, அதிக உயர்ந்த மொழிகளுக்கிடையி இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் பேபெல்நெட்டின் பொருள் பாதுகாப்பு (BMR), ஒரு மொழி வடிவமைப்பு, மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட கட்டுப்பாடுகளிலிருந்து வெளியேறுகிறது, பாபெல்நெட BMR உருவாக்கத்தின் பின்னால் விகிதத்தை நாம் விவரிக்கிறோம் BMR 1. 0 என்பதை முழுமையாக புதிய வடிவமைப்புக்குரிய தகவல் அமைப் Moreover, we show how BMR is able to outperform previous formalisms thanks to its fully-semantic framing, which enables top-notch multilingual parsing and generation.  நாம் குறியீட்டை வெளியேற்றுகிறோம் https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ur': 'بے اختیار کی زبان کی تعبیر کی ایک خواب ہے جو طبیعی زبان سمجھنے میں بہترین خواب ہیں۔ اس مقصد کے ذریعہ سے بہت سی فرمولیسم کی تعبیر کے لئے فرمولیسم کے طور پر پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے۔ اور لیکن، ان فرمولیسموں کی تعریف علم کی زبانوں کے معاملہ میں شریک ہوتی ہے، ان کی تعریف کا موقع ہے کہ ان کی تعریف بالا اور کم رسسور زبانوں کے درمیان بند کرنا مشکل ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم BabelNet معنی نمایش (BMR) کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک متفاوت زبان کی روشنی جو زبان کے مطابق محدودیت سے دور ہوتی ہے، اور BabelNet اور VerbAtlas کے بہت سی زبان سیمنٹی موجودات کا فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔ ہم BMR کی پیدائش کے پیچھے منطقی کا مفصل بیان کرتے ہیں اور BMR 1.0 کو آگے بھیج دیتے ہیں، ایک ڈیٹ سٹ جو نئی فرمولیسم کے مطابق کامل لکھی جاتی ہے. اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ BMR کس طرح پہلے کی فرمولیسم کو اس کی پوری سیمانٹی فرموینگ کے شکریہ کرسکتا ہے جو بہت سی زبان پارسینگ اور نسل کو امکان دیتا ہے۔ ہم کوڈ کو آزاد کرتے ہیں https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'uz': "Tilning o'zgarishni o'zgartirish, tabiiy tilda o'rganish eng eng yaxshi orzularidan biri. Bu maqsadda, Semantic Parsing davomida tashkilotni namuna qilish uchun bir necha formatlarini chiqaradi. Lekin, bu formatlarning muammolari илм haqida o'rganish xabarlariga ega bo'lishi mumkin, yuqori va kichkina murakkablar orasidagi gap yopish uchun juda qiyin. Bu qogʻozda biz BabelNet (BMR) ma'nosi (BMR) bilan bir interlingual formatlarini ko'p tildan foydalanishimiz mumkin BabelNet va VerbAtlasning bir necha tildagi semantik rasmlaridan foydalanish mumkin. Biz BMR yaratish haqida qiymatni anglatamiz va BMR 1.0 bilan birga yangi formatlash davomida nomlangan maʼlumotlar satri. Ko'rib, biz BMR oldingi formatlarni qanday bajarishini ko'rsatdik. Bu bir necha tildagi parsing va avloqni yordam beradi. Biz qoidani https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'vi': 'Một đại diện ngôn ngữ độc lập về ý nghĩa là một trong những ước mơ được khao khát nhất trong hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Với mục tiêu này trong đầu, nhiều chính thức đã được đề xuất như một cấu trúc cho sự đóng góp ý nghĩa trong phân tích Semantic. Tuy nhiên, mối quan hệ giữa các chính thức chia sẻ với nhau về các kho lưu trữ ngôn ngữ đặc biệt về kiến thức khiến mục tiêu của việc thu hẹp khoảng cách giữa các ngôn ngữ giàu và nghèo khó đạt được. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu cô Bảo nhúc Nghĩa vụ trên mạng (BMR), một chính thức lưỡng điệu mà thoát khỏi các giới hạn ngôn ngữ, bằng cách tận dụng các nguồn lực ngữ học đa dạng của BabeNet và Verbis. Chúng tôi mô tả lý do căn bản đằng sau việc tạo BMR 1.0, một tập tin được ghi rõ hoàn to àn theo chính thức mới. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng BMR có thể hoàn thành các chính thức trước nhờ vào khung hình đầy-nghĩa-nghĩa-nghĩa, tạo và phân loại loại hảo hạng đa dạng. Chúng ta giải mã ở https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'bg': 'Независимото от езика представяне на смисъла е една от най-желаните мечти в разбирането на естествения език. С тази цел са предложени няколко формализма като рамки за представяне на смисъла в семантичното анализиране. И все пак зависимостта, която споделят тези формализми по отношение на специфичните за езика хранилища на знания, прави целта за затваряне на пропастта между езиците с висок и нисък ресурс трудна за постигане. В настоящата статия представяме интерезичен формализъм, който абстракира специфичните езикови ограничения, като се възползва от многоезичните семантични ресурси на БабелNet и ВърбАтлас. Описваме обосновката зад създаването на БМР и представяме БМР 1.0, набор от данни, обозначен изцяло според новия формализъм. Освен това, ние показваме как е в състояние да надмине предишните формализми благодарение на напълно семантичното си рамкиране, което позволява първокласно многоезично анализиране и генериране. Ще пуснем кода на https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'nl': 'Een taalonafhankelijke representatie van betekenis is een van de meest begeerde dromen in Natural Language Understanding. Met dit doel in gedachten zijn verschillende formalismen voorgesteld als kaders voor betekenisrepresentatie in Semantic Parsing. En toch maken de afhankelijkheden die deze formalismen delen met betrekking tot taal-specifieke opslagplaatsen van kennis het doel om de kloof tussen high- en low-resourced talen te dichten moeilijk te bereiken. In dit artikel presenteren we de BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), een interlingual formalisme dat abstraheert van taalspecifieke beperkingen door gebruik te maken van de meertalige semantische bronnen van BabelNet en VerbAtlas. We beschrijven de reden achter de oprichting van BMR en stellen BMR 1.0 voor, een dataset volledig gelabeld volgens het nieuwe formalisme. Bovendien laten we zien hoe BMR eerdere formalismen kan overtreffen dankzij zijn volledig semantische framing, die hoogwaardige meertalige parsing en generatie mogelijk maakt. We geven de code vrij op https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'da': 'En sproguafhængig repræsentation af mening er en af de mest eftertragtede drømme i Natural Language Forståelse. Med dette mål i tankerne er flere formalismer blevet foreslået som rammer for meningsrepræsentation i Semantic Parsing. Og alligevel gør de afhængigheder disse formalismer deler med hensyn til sprogspecifikke videnslagre målet om at lukke kløften mellem sprog med høj og lav ressource svært at opnå. I denne artikel præsenterer vi BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), en tværsproget formalisme, der abstraherer væk fra sprogspecifikke begrænsninger ved at udnytte de flersprogede semantiske ressourcer i BabelNet og VerbAtlas. Vi beskriver begrundelsen bag skabelsen af BMR og fremlagde BMR 1.0, et datasæt mærket helt efter den nye formalisme. Desuden viser vi, hvordan BMR er i stand til at udføre tidligere formalismer takket være sin fuldt semantiske framing, der muliggør top-notch flersproget parsing og generering. Vi frigiver koden på https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'hr': 'Jedan od najželjenijih snova u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika je zastupanje značenja. S tim ciljem na umu, predloženo je nekoliko formalizma kao okvira za značenje zastupanja u semantičkom razmatranju. A ipak, ovisnosti ovih formalizma dijele u pogledu registracija znanja koje su specifični jezicima čine cilj zatvaranja praznina između visokih i niskih izvora jezika teško postići. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Međujezički formalizam BabelNet-a (BMR), koji se odvlači od ograničenja jezika specifičnih jezika koristeći višejezičke semantičke resurse BabelNet i VerbAtlas. Mi opisujemo racional iza stvaranja BMR-a i predstavljamo BMR 1.0, kompletnu kompletu podataka označenu potpuno prema novom formalizmu. Osim toga, pokazujemo kako BMR može izvršiti prethodne formalizme zahvaljujući svom potpuno semantičkom okviru, što omogućava vrhunsku multijezičku analizu i generaciju. Puštamo šifru na https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'id': 'Perwakilan dari arti yang bebas dari bahasa adalah salah satu mimpi yang paling diinginkan dalam Bahasa Alami Memahami. With this goal in mind, several formalisms have been proposed as frameworks for meaning representation in Semantic Parsing.  Namun, ketergantuan formalisme-formalisme ini berbagi mengenai repositori pengetahuan spesifik bahasa membuat tujuan untuk menutup jarak antara bahasa-bahasa yang tinggi dan rendah sumber daya sulit untuk diselesaikan. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Perwakilan Maksudnya BabelNet (BMR), formalisme antar bahasa yang menjauh dari batasan bahasa-spesifik dengan mengambil keuntungan dari sumber daya semantis berbagai bahasa BabelNet dan VerbAtlas. Kami menggambarkan rasional di balik pembuatan BMR dan melanjutkan BMR 1.0, sebuah set data yang disebut sepenuhnya menurut formalisme baru. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bagaimana BMR mampu melampaui formalisme sebelumnya terima kasih pada bingkai yang sepenuhnya semantis, yang memungkinkan penganalisan dan generasi berbagai bahasa. Kami melepaskan kode di https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'de': 'Eine sprachunabhängige Darstellung von Bedeutung ist einer der begehrtesten Träume im Natural Language Understanding. Zu diesem Zweck wurden mehrere Formalismen als Rahmen für die Bedeutungsrepräsentation in Semantic Parsing vorgeschlagen. Und doch erschweren die Abhängigkeiten, die diese Formalismen in Bezug auf sprachspezifische Wissensspeicher teilen, das Ziel, die Lücke zwischen hoch- und niedrig ressourcenreichen Sprachen zu schließen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR) vor, einen interlingualen Formalismus, der von sprachspezifischen Zwängen abstrahiert, indem er die mehrsprachigen semantischen Ressourcen von BabelNet und VerbAtlas nutzt. Wir beschreiben die Gründe für die Schaffung von BMR und stellen BMR 1.0 vor, einen Datensatz, der vollständig nach dem neuen Formalismus gekennzeichnet ist. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, wie BMR bisherige Formalismen dank seines voll-semantischen Framing übertreffen kann, das erstklassige mehrsprachige Parsing und Generierung ermöglicht. Wir veröffentlichen den Code unter https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ko': '언어에 독립된 의미 표현은 자연 언어 이해에서 가장 탐나는 꿈 중 하나다.이 목표를 실현하기 위해 사람들은 몇 가지 형식주의를 의미 분석에서 의미 표시의 틀로 제시했다.그러나 이러한 형식주의가 특정 언어 지식 라이브러리에 대한 의존성 때문에 높은 자원과 낮은 자원 언어 간의 격차를 메우는 목표는 실현하기 어렵다.본고에서 우리는 BabelNet의 의미표현(BMR)을 제기했는데 이것은 언어 간 형식주의이다. BabelNet과VerbAtlas의 다중 언어 의미 자원을 이용하여 특정한 언어의 제약에서 추상화된다.우리는 BMR을 만드는 기본 원리를 묘사하고 완전히 새로운 형식주의에 따라 표시된 데이터 집합인 BMR 1.0을 제시했다.또한 BMR은 완전한 의미 구조로 인해 일류의 다언어 해석과 생성을 실현하고 이전의 형식주의를 초월할 수 있음을 보여 주었다.우리https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'sw': 'Uwakilishaji huru wa lugha wa maana ni moja ya ndoto zilizotamani zaidi katika kuelewa lugha ya asili. Kwa lengo hili akilini, utaratibu kadhaa umependekezwa kama mfumo wa kuwakilisha katika Parsing ya Semantic. Na bado, kutegemea rasmi hizi zinasambaza kuhusiana na makala maalum ya ufahamu katika lugha hii inafanya lengo la kufunga tofauti kati ya lugha za juu na zenye rasilimali zisizo vigumu kufikia. In this paper, we present the BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), an interlingual formalism that abstracts away from language-specific constraints by taking advantage of the multilingual semantic resources of BabelNet and VerbAtlas.  Tunaelezea rasilimali nyuma ya kuumbwa kwa BMR na kuweka BMR 1.0, seti ya taarifa inayoonyesha kwa mujibu wa utaratibu mpya. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha jinsi BMR inavyoweza kufanya utaratibu wa zamani kwa shukrani ya misukosuko yake ya kimapenzi, ambayo inawezesha kuimba kwa lugha mbalimbali na kizazi chake. Tunaachia sheria https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'fa': 'یک نمایش مستقل به زبان معنی یکی از بهترین خواب\u200cها در درک زبان طبیعی است. با این هدف در ذهن، چندین فرمولیسم به عنوان فرمولی برای معنی نمایش در پارش سامانتیک پیشنهاد شده است. و با این حال، بستگی\u200cهایی که این رسمی\u200cها با ارتباط به ذخیره\u200cهای دانش\u200cهای مخصوص زبان\u200cها شریک می\u200cشوند، هدف بستن فاصله بین زبان\u200cهای بالا و کم منابع را سخت به انجام دادن می\u200cدهند. در این کاغذ، ما نماینده\u200cی معنی BabelNet (BMR) را نشان می\u200cدهیم، یک فرمولیسم بین زبان\u200cها که از محدودیت\u200cهای ویژه\u200cی زبان دور می\u200cشود، با استفاده از منابع\u200cهای semantic multilingual BabelNet و VerbAtlas استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما منطقی پشت خلقت BMR را توصیف می\u200cکنیم و BMR 1.0 را پیش می\u200cفرستیم، یک مجموعه داده\u200cای که کاملاً بر اساس رسمی جدید علامت داده شده است. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه BMR قادر است از رسمی های قبلی به سپاسگزاری فرم\u200cهای کامل semantic خود انجام دهد، که به پاره\u200cسازی و نسل\u200cهای بیشتر زبان\u200cها اجازه می\u200cدهد. ما کد را آزاد می کنیم https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'tr': "Doýal dilde düşünýän iň arzuwyň biri. Bu maksady aklında, Semantik Parsing'da bir näçe formalizm sany frameworklar hökmünde teklip edildi. Ýöne bu formalizmleriň bilim depolaryna golaýlaşyk bilen baglanyşyklary ýokary we iň ýokary bolan dilleriň arasyndaky boşluklaryny düşürmek üçin kyn maksady çykarýar. Bu kagyzda, BabelNet ýaly meýdança temsilcisini (BMR), BabelNet we VerbAtlas dilleriniň çoklu dilleriň semantik çeşmelerinden uzaklaşdyryp, dilleriň takyk çärelerinden uzaklaşdyran bir formalizmi görkeýäris. BMR dörediginiň arkasynda nähili maglumaty tassyýarys we BMR 1.0-y öňe goýýarys. Munuň üçin BMR'iň öňki formalizmleriň tamamlanmagy üçin nähili edip biljekdigini görkezip bilýäris. Bu ýerde birnäçe dilli analyz we generasiýasyny mümkin edip bilýär. Şahsy çykarýarys https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'sq': 'Një përfaqësim i pavarur nga gjuha i kuptimit është një nga ëndrrat më të kënaqura në kuptimin e gjuhës natyrore. Me këtë qëllim në mendje, disa formalizma janë propozuar si kuadri për përfaqësimin e kuptimit në analizën Semantike. Dhe megjithatë, varësitë që këto formalizma ndajnë lidhur me depozitat e njohurive specifike gjuhës e bëjnë objektivin e mbylljes së dallimit midis gjuhëve me burime të larta dhe të ulta të vështira për të arritur. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim përfaqësimin e kuptimit të BabelNet (BMR), një formalizëm ndërgjuhësor që abstrakton larg kufizimeve specifike gjuhës duke përfituar nga burimet shumëgjuhësore semantike të BabelNet dhe VerbAtlas. Ne e përshkruajmë arsyetimin pas krijimit të BMR dhe paraqesim BMR 1.0, një grup të dhënash të etiketuar plotësisht sipas formalizmit të ri. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se si BMR është në gjendje të kryejë formalizmat e mëparshme falë kuadrit plotësisht semantik të saj, që mundëson analizimin dhe gjenerimin e shumëgjuhëve më të lartë. Ne lëshojmë kodin në https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ነፃ አካላዊ መልዕክት በናብሬል ቋንቋ ማስተዋል ከሚመኘው ሕልሞች አንዱ ነው፡፡ በዚህ አካሄድ፣ ብዙዎች ፎርማሌዎች በሴማቲክ ፓርቲ ማህበረሰብ አካባቢ ናቸው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ እነዚህ ፎርማሌዎች በተመሳሳይ ቋንቋ-በተለይ እውቀት ሰራፊዎችን ለመፈጸም ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የባቢሎን ነጥብ እና VerbAtlas በቋንቋ-በተለይ ግንኙነቶችን በመጠቀም የባቢሎን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እና የተለየ የልዩ ቋንቋዎች የsemantic ሀብትን ለመጠቀም የሚለውን (BMR) አቀረብን፡፡ BMR ፍጥረት ጀምሮ አካሄዱን እናሳውቃለን BMR 1.0፣ በአዲስ ፍሬማሌ የተመሳሳይ የዳታተር setን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እናም ብኤርር የቀድሞውን የፊርማሲ ምርጫዎች እንዴት እንደሚችል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ከ https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'af': "'n Taal-Onfhanklike voorsiening van betekening is een van die mees begeerte dromme in Natuurlike Taal Verstaan. Met hierdie doel in gedagte is verskeie formalisme voorgestel as raamwerke vir betekening voorgestel in Semantiese verwerking. En nogtans, die afhanklikhede van hierdie formalisme deel met respek na taal-spesifieke stoorplekke van kennis maak die doel om die afstand te sluit tussen hoë en lae-hulpbron tale moeilik te vervul. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons die BabelNet betekende voorstelling (BMR), â\x80\x99n interlinglike formalisme wat wegtrek van taal spesifieke beheinings deur voordeel te neem van die multilinglike semantiese hulpbronne van BabelNet en VerbAtlas. Ons beskryf die rationale agter die skepping van BMR en sit voor BMR 1. 0 'n datastel wat heeltemal gemerk is volgens die nuwe formalisme. Ook, ons wys hoe BMR kan voorige formalisme uitvoer dankie aan sy volledige semantiese raam, wat die boonste-notch multitaalske verwerking en generasie kan doen. Ons verlos die kode op https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'hy': 'Իմաստի լեզվից անկախ ներկայացումը բնական լեզվի հասկացության մեջ ամենահոգված երազանքներից մեկն է: Այս նպատակի հետ առնելով, մի քանի ֆորմալիզմներ են առաջարկվել որպես համակարգեր, որոնք նշանակում են ներկայացնել սեմանտիկ վերլուծում: Եվ չնայած դրան, այս ֆորմալիզմների կախվածությունը գիտելիքի լեզվի մասնավոր պահեստանշանների հետ դժվար է հասնել նպատակին վերացնել բացառությունը բարձր և ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուների միջև: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Բաբելնեթ նշանակության ներկայացումը (BMR), մի միջլեզվային ֆորմալիզմ, որը վերացնում է լեզվի մասնավոր սահմանափակումներից օգտագործելով Բաբելնեթ և Վերբաթլասի բազլեզվական սեմանտիկ ռեսուրսները: We describe the rationale behind the creation of BMR and put forward BMR 1.0, a dataset labeled entirely according to the new formalism.  Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես է BMR-ը կարողանում կատարել նախորդ ֆորմալիզմները, շնորհիվ իր ամբողջովին սեմանտիկ կառուցվածքին, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմալեզու վերլուծություն և սերունդ: Մենք հրապարակում ենք կոդը https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'bn': 'মানে একটি ভাষার স্বাধীন প্রতিনিধিত্ব হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় সবচেয়ে আনন্দিত স্বপ্ন। এই লক্ষ্যে সেম্যান্টিক পার্জিং এর মানে প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি ফরমালিজম প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। এরপরেও, এই বিষয়গুলোর নির্ভর করে ভাষার নির্দিষ্ট জ্ঞানের রিপোর্টির সম্পর্কে ভাষায় শেয়ার করা হয়েছে যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে উচ্চ এবং কম সম্পদের ভাষা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বেবেল নেটের মানে প্রতিনিধি প্রতিনিধিত্ব (বিএমআর) উপস্থাপন করি একটি ইন্টারনেট ভাষায় বৈশিষ্ট্য-নির্দিষ্ট বিধান থেকে দূরে যাচ্ছে বেবেল নেট এবং ভার আমরা বিএমআর সৃষ্টির পেছনে যৌক্তিকতা বর্ণনা করি এবং বিএমআর ১. এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে বিএমআর পূর্ববর্তী ফরামিলসমূহ প্রকাশ করতে পারে তার পুরো সেম্পেন্টিক ব্যাঙ্গিং এর কারণে ধন্যবাদ, যা  We release the code at  https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'az': "Təbiətli Dil anlaşılmasında ən istənilən rüyalardan biridir. Bu məqsəd qəlbində, Semantik Parsing üçün bir neçə formalizm təklif edildi. Halbuki, bu formalismlərin məlumatları dillərin məxluqatı ilə paylaşırlar, həqiqətən də, yüksək və düşük qüvvətli dillər arasındakı boşluqları yerinə yetirmək üçün çətin olar. Bu kağızda BabelNet'in anlamını göstəririk, BabelNet və VerbAtlas'ın çoxlu dil semantik kaynaqlarından istifadə edərək dil müəyyən müddətlərindən uzaqlaşdırılmış bir formalizm. BMR yaradılışının arxasındaki razıllığı təsdiqləyirik və BMR 1.0-ni, yeni formalism ə görə tamamilə etiket edilmiş verilən verilən quruluşu təsdiqləyirik. Daha sonra, BMR'in əvvəlki formalismi tamamlayıb-semantik framlamasına görə necə edə biləcəyini göstəririk ki, bu çoxlu dil analizi və nəslini mümkün edə bilər. Biz kodu açıq https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'ca': "Una representació del sentit independent de la llengua és un dels somnis més apassionats de l'Entensió de la Llingua Natural. Tenint en compte aquest objectiu, s'han proposat diversos formalismes com marcs per a representar el sentit en l'analisi semàtica. And yet, the dependencies these formalisms share with respect to language-specific repositories of knowledge make the objective of closing the gap between high- and low-resourced languages hard to accomplish.  En aquest article, presentem la Representació del Significant de BabelNet (BMR), un formalisme interlingüístic que s'abstracta de les restriccions específices del llenguatge aprofitant els recursos semàntics multilingües de BabelNet i VerbAtlas. Descrivem la raó darrera de la creació del BMR i vam presentar el BMR 1.0, un conjunt de dades etiquetat completament segons el nou formalisme. A més, demostram com el BMR és capaç de superar els formalismes anteriors gràcies al seu marc plenament semàntic, que permet l'analització i la generació multilingües de millor nivell. Vam alliberar el codi https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'cs': 'Jazykově nezávislé zobrazení významu je jedním z nejžádanějších snů v porozumění přirozenému jazyce. S tímto cílem bylo navrženo několik formalismů jako rámce pro reprezentaci významů v sémantickém parsing. A přesto závislosti, které tyto formalismy sdílejí s ohledem na jazykově specifické repozitáře znalostí, činí cíl uzavřít mezeru mezi jazyky s vysokými a nízkými zdroji obtížně dosažitelným. V tomto článku představujeme BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), mezijazyčný formalismus, který abstrahuje od jazykových omezení využitím vícejazyčných sémantických zdrojů BabelNet a VerbAtlas. Popisujeme důvod vzniku BMR a představujeme BMR 1.0, datovou sadu označenou zcela podle nového formalismu. Navíc ukazujeme, jak BMR dokáže překonat předchozí formalismy díky plně sémantickému rámování, které umožňuje špičkové mnohojazyčné parsování a generování. Kód uvolníme na https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'bs': 'Jedna od najželjenijih snova u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika je zastupanje značenja. S tim ciljem na umu, predloženo je nekoliko formalizma kao okvira za smisao predstavljanja u semantičkom razmatranju. A ipak, ovisnosti ovih formalizma dijele u pogledu repozitorija znanja za jezik određenih jezika čine cilj zatvaranja razdoblja između visokih i niskih resursa teško postići. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Međujezički formalizam BabelNet-a (BMR), koji se odvlači od ograničenja jezika specifičnih jezika koristeći množijezičke semantičke resurse BabelNet i VerbAtlas. Opišemo racional iza stvaranja BMR-a i predstavljamo BMR 1.0, kompletnu kompletu podataka označenu potpuno prema novom formalizmu. Osim toga, pokazujemo kako BMR može izvršiti prethodne formalizme zahvaljujući svom potpuno semantičkom okviru, što omogućava vrhunsku multijezičku analizu i generaciju. Puštamo šifru na https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'et': 'Keelest sõltumatu tähenduse esindamine on loodusliku keele mõistmise üks ihaldatuimaid unistusi. Seda eesmärki silmas pidades on semantilises parsingis välja pakutud mitmeid formaalsusi. Kuid nende formaalsuste ühised sõltuvused keelespetsiifiliste teadmiste hoidlate suhtes muudavad eesmärgi kõrge ja madala ressursiga keelte vahelise lõhe kaotamiseks raskeks. Käesolevas töös tutvustame BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), keeltevahelist formalismi, mis võtab ära keelespetsiifilised piirangud, kasutades ära BabelNeti ja VerbAtlas mitmekeelseid semantilisi ressursse. Kirjeldame BMR loomise põhjendust ja esitame BMR 1.0, andmekogumi, mis on märgistatud täielikult vastavalt uuele formaalsusele. Lisaks näitame, kuidas BMR on võimeline ületama varasemaid formaalsusi tänu täielikult semantilisele raamimisele, mis võimaldab tipptasemel mitmekeelset parsimist ja genereerimist. Me avaldame koodi https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'fi': 'Kielestä riippumaton merkitys on yksi halutuimmista unelmista luonnollisen kielen ymmärtämisessä. Tätä tarkoitusta silmällä pitäen on ehdotettu useita muodollisuuksia viitekehyksiksi merkitysten esittämiselle semanttisessa parsingissa. Kuitenkin näiden muodollisuuksien riippuvuus kielikohtaisista tietovarastoista tekee tavoitteesta kuroa umpeen suurten ja vähävaraisten kielten välillä vaikeasti saavutettavissa. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), kielienvälinen formalismi, joka abstraktoi pois kielikohtaisista rajoituksista hyödyntämällä BabelNetin ja VerbAtlasin monikielisiä semanttisia resursseja. Kuvaamme BMR:n luomisen perusteet ja esitämme BMR 1.0:n, joka on täysin uuden formalismin mukainen. Lisäksi näytämme, miten BMR pystyy ylittämään aiemmat muodollisuudet täysin semanttisen kehystyksensä ansiosta, joka mahdollistaa huippuluokan monikielisen jäsentämisen ja generoinnin. Julkaisemme koodin https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan kelas-kenapakno sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé kuwi mau sing luwih apik dhéwé ning basa sing luwih apik. Genjer-genjer saiki iki dadi, akeh formalizasi ininggawe ngupakan pawaran podho akhar structural navigation Saiki, dipurangké karo hal-hal kuwi tindang kuwi nggawe gerakan karo paké kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngubah gap banjure tindang wis luwih karo paké, lan akeh iso nggawe gerakan. Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nggawe repréentasi babelnet mengko bebelnet, formalim langkung sing isiné awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe nguasai perusahaan langgar sapa-perusahaan seneng nggawe nguasai bebelnet karo VerbAts. Awakdhéwé ngpisan perusahaan nggawe barang nggawe geranggap karo MbR 1.0 Laptop" and "Desktop Awakdhéwé menggo kode nang https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'he': 'מייצג משמעות עצמאי בשפה הוא אחד החלומות הכי חמודים בהבנת השפה הטבעית. בהתחשב במטרה הזו, כמה רשמיות הציעו כמסגרות למציגת משמעות בפרסינג סמנטי. ובכל זאת, התלויות שהפורמליזמים האלה חולקים בנוגע למחסנים של ידע ספציפיים לשפה גורמים למטרה לסגור את הפער בין שפות גבוהות ושפות נמוכות קשה להשיג. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את מייצג המשמעות של BabelNet (BMR), רשמיות בין שפות שמאסטרטת מרחק מגבלות ספציפיות לשפה על ידי ניצל משאבי סמנטיים רבות שפות של BabelNet ו VerbAtlas. We describe the rationale behind the creation of BMR and put forward BMR 1.0, a dataset labeled entirely according to the new formalism.  חוץ מזה, אנו מראים איך BMR מסוגל להעביר את הפורמליזמים הקודמים תודות למסגרת הסמנטית שלה, אשר מאפשר בדיקת ורק דור רבות שפות. אנחנו משחררים את הקוד ב https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'sk': 'Jezikovno neodvisna predstavitev pomena je ena najbolj zaželenih sanj v razumevanju naravnega jezika. S tem ciljem je bilo predlaganih več formalizmov kot okvirov za predstavitev pomena v semantičnem razpravljanju. Vendar pa je zaradi odvisnosti teh formalizmov glede na jezikovne zbirke znanja težko doseči cilj zapolnitve vrzeli med jeziki z visokimi in nizkimi viri. V prispevku predstavljamo BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), medjezični formalizem, ki izkorišča večjezične semantične vire BabelNet in VerbAtlas. Opisali smo utemeljitev ustvarjanja BMR in predstavili BMR 1.0, nabor podatkov, označen v celoti po novem formalizmu. Poleg tega pokažemo, kako lahko BMR presega prejšnje formalizme zahvaljujoč popolnoma semantičnemu okvirjanju, ki omogoča vrhunsko večjezično razčlenjevanje in generiranje. Kodo bomo objavili ob https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.', 'ha': "An ba da wadangan harshe-hure wa fassaran ta zama daga mafiya son zukata a cikin Lugha Kiasal. Da wannan goa a karanta, an ƙayyade wasu formalism kamar firam wa muhimmin wakilishi cikin Parse na Semantic. Na daidai, masu inganci da waɗannan formalism sunã samun su da tsarori masu cikin harshen da aka ƙayyade ilmi, sai ya sanya goani da ya rufe gaura tsakanin harshen sarki da ƙasan-da-yanzu da aka danne su yin adadi zuwa. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da BabelNet Ina gaya Reposition (BMR), wata formalism mai interlingui wanda ke yanke away daga tsaro-ƙayyade harshen-na'ura da kuma ke amfani da manyan mutane na BabelNet da VerbAtlas. We describe the rationale behind the creation of BMR and put forward BMR 1.0, a dataset labeled entirely according to the new formalism.  Kayya, Munã nũna BMR yadda zai iya iya samar da formalism na farko, kuma tuna bakin shekara ta cikakki-semantic, wanda yana iya amfani da parse-multi-linguin da multi-lingui. Munã sakar da kodi a https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.", 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་དང་རང་བཞིན་པའི་མིང་རྟོགས་ཅན་ཅིག་ནི་རང་བཞིན་སྐད་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་ཤུགས་གཅིག་རེད། དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལ་བསམ་བློ་ཡོད་པའི་དོན་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་། རྣམ་པ་ལྡན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག དེ་ནའང་དུ། རྨན་གཞུང་རྩིས་འདི་དག་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག In this paper, we present the BabelNet Meaning Representation (BMR), an interlingual formalism that abstracts away from language-specific constraints by taking advantage of the multilingual semantic resources of BabelNet and VerbAtlas. The multilingual semantic resources of BabelNet and VerbAtlas. We describe the rationale behind the creation of BMR and put forward BMR 1.0, a dataset labeled entirely according to the new formalism. ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་BMR་གིས་ཅི་སྔོན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་བྱེད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཨང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ https://github.com/SapienzaNLP/bmr.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من المستخدمين المماثلين لنمذجة لغة مخصصة ببيانات محدودة', 'pt': 'Aproveitando usuários semelhantes para modelagem de linguagem personalizada com dados limitados', 'fr': 'Exploiter des utilisateurs similaires pour une modélisation linguistique personnalisée avec des données limitées', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de usuarios similares para el modelado de idiomas personalizado con datos limitados', 'ja': '限られたデータでパーソナライズされた言語モデリングのために同様のユーザーを活用する', 'zh': '利用类用户个性化言语建模', 'hi': 'सीमित डेटा के साथ व्यक्तिगत भाषा मॉडलिंग के लिए समान उपयोगकर्ताओं का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'Использование похожих пользователей для персонализированного языкового моделирования с ограниченными данными', 'ga': 'Úsáideoirí Cosúla a Ghiaráil le haghaidh Samhaltú Pearsanta Teanga le Sonraí Teoranta', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση παρόμοιων χρηστών για εξατομικευμένη μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών με περιορισμένα δεδομένα', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Hasonló felhasználók kihasználása a személyre szabott nyelvi modellezéshez korlátozott adatokkal', 'it': 'Sfruttare utenti simili per la modellazione linguistica personalizzata con dati limitati', 'kk': 'Жергілікті тіл үлгілеу үшін жинақталған пайдаланушылар', 'lt': 'Panašių asmeninių kalbų modeliavimo naudotojų naudojimas ribotais duomenimis', 'mk': 'Разголемување на сличните корисници за персонализирано моделирање на јазик со ограничени податоци', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിപരമാക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡിലേക്കുള്ള ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d ലെവെര്\u200dവര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നുName', 'ms': 'Menegang Pengguna Sama untuk Model Bahasa Tersendiri dengan Data Terhadir', 'mn': 'Хязгаарлагдсан хэл загварчлалын төстэй хэрэглэгчид хязгаарлагдсан өгөгдлийн хувьд Leveraging Similar Users for Personalized Language Modeling with Limited Data', 'mt': 'L-għoti ta’ livell ta’ utenti simili għall-Immudellar tal-Lingwi Personalizzati b’Dejta Limitata', 'no': 'Leverande liknande brukarar for personalisert språk- modellering med begrensede data', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie podobnych użytkowników do spersonalizowanego modelowania języka z ograniczonymi danymi', 'ro': 'Utilizarea utilizatorilor similari pentru modelarea personalizată a limbajului cu date limitate', 'so': 'Isticmaalayaasha Iswidish u eg ee Iswidishka Luqada shakhsiyanka ah ee la sameynayo macluumaadka Limited', 'sr': 'Similarni korisnici za personalizaciju jezika sa ograničenim podacima', 'sv': 'Utnyttja liknande användare för personlig språkmodellering med begränsade data', 'ta': 'Name', 'si': 'පුද්ගලික භාෂා මොඩේල් එක්ක සීමාවිත දත්ත සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරිය භාවිතාකරණය', 'ur': 'لیمیٹ ڈاٹ کے ساتھ شخصی زبان موڈلینگ کے لئے سیمیل کارساز لیورڈ کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Người dùng tương tự cấp cho mô hình ngôn ngữ tự chọn với Chỉ Huy Dữ liệu', 'bg': 'Използване на подобни потребители за персонализирано езиково моделиране с ограничени данни', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af lignende brugere til personlig sprogmodellering med begrænsede data', 'nl': 'Vergelijkbare gebruikers gebruiken voor gepersonaliseerde taalmodellering met beperkte gegevens', 'hr': 'Slični korisnici za osobizirani jezik modeliranje s ograničenim podacima', 'id': 'Mengangkat Pengguna yang Sama untuk Modeling Bahasa Personalisasi dengan Data Terbatas', 'de': 'Nutzung ähnlicher Benutzer für personalisierte Sprachmodellierung mit begrenzten Daten', 'ko': '비슷한 사용자를 이용하여 유한한 데이터 아래에서 개성화된 언어 모델링을 진행하다', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Watumiaji wa lugha za kibinafsi kwa kutumia taarifa Bora', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përdoruesit e ngjashëm për modelimin e gjuhës së personalizuar me të dhëna të kufizuara', 'hy': 'Նմանատիպ օգտագործողների մակարդակը անձնական լեզվի մոդելավորման համար սահմանափակ տվյալներով', 'am': 'የተለመደው ጭብጥ', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Diller bilen Taýýarlanan Ullançylar', 'az': 'Ňěahsiyy…ôtli Dil Modelin…ô b…ônz…ôr istifad…ô√ßil…ôr', 'bn': 'সীমিত তথ্যের সাথে ব্যক্তিগত ভাষা মডেলের জন্য লেভারেজিং করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Similarni korisnici za personalizaciju jezika s ograničenim podacima', 'ca': 'Ampliar usuaris similars per a modelar llenguatges personalitzats amb dades limitades', 'cs': 'Využití podobných uživatelů pro personalizované modelování jazyka s omezenými daty', 'et': 'Sarnaste kasutajate kasutamine piiratud andmetega isikupärastatud keele modelleerimiseks', 'fi': 'Samankaltaisten käyttäjien hyödyntäminen henkilökohtaisessa kielimallinnuksessa rajoitetulla datalla', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'משתמשים דומים למדליגת שפת אישית עם נתונים מוגבלים', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje podobnih uporabnikov za prilagojeno jezikovno modeliranje z omejenimi podatki', 'bo': 'Leveraging Similar Users for Personalized Language Modeling with Limited Data'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained models for programming languages have recently demonstrated great success on code intelligence. To support both code-related understanding and generation tasks, recent works attempt to pre-train unified encoder-decoder models. However, such encoder-decoder framework is sub-optimal for auto-regressive tasks, especially code completion that requires a decoder-only manner for efficient inference. In this paper, we present UniXcoder, a unified cross-modal pre-trained model for programming language. The model utilizes mask attention matrices with prefix adapters to control the behavior of the model and leverages cross-modal contents like AST and code comment to enhance code representation. To encode AST that is represented as a tree in parallel, we propose a one-to-one mapping method to transform AST in a sequence structure that retains all structural information from the tree. Furthermore, we propose to utilize multi-modal contents to learn representation of code fragment with contrastive learning, and then align representations among programming languages using a cross-modal generation task. We evaluate UniXcoder on five code-related tasks over nine datasets. To further evaluate the performance of code fragment representation, we also construct a dataset for a new task, called zero-shot code-to-code search. Results show that our model achieves state-of-the-art performance on most tasks and analysis reveals that comment and AST can both enhance UniXcoder.', 'ar': 'تم تصميم نماذج اللغة المخصصة وتدريبها لالتقاط أنماط اللغة الخاصة بالمستخدمين الفرديين. هذا يجعلها أكثر دقة في التنبؤ بما سيكتبه المستخدم. ومع ذلك ، عندما ينضم مستخدم جديد إلى نظام أساسي ولا يتوفر نص كافٍ ، يكون من الصعب بناء نماذج لغة مخصصة فعالة. نقترح حلاً لهذه المشكلة ، باستخدام نموذج تم تدريبه على مستخدمين مشابهين لمستخدم جديد. في هذه الورقة ، نستكشف استراتيجيات لإيجاد التشابه بين المستخدمين الجدد والمستخدمين الحاليين وطرق استخدام البيانات من المستخدمين الحاليين المطابقين بشكل جيد. نستكشف كذلك المفاضلة بين البيانات المتاحة للمستخدمين الجدد ومدى جودة نمذجة لغتهم.', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem personalizados são projetados e treinados para capturar padrões de linguagem específicos para usuários individuais. Isso os torna mais precisos em prever o que um usuário escreverá. No entanto, quando um novo usuário ingressa em uma plataforma e não há texto suficiente disponível, é mais difícil construir modelos de linguagem personalizados eficazes. Propomos uma solução para este problema, usando um modelo treinado em usuários semelhantes a um novo usuário. Neste artigo, exploramos estratégias para encontrar a semelhança entre novos usuários e os existentes e métodos para usar os dados de usuários existentes que são uma boa correspondência. Exploramos ainda mais o trade-off entre os dados disponíveis para novos usuários e quão bem sua linguagem pode ser modelada.', 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos personalizados están diseñados y entrenados para capturar patrones lingüísticos específicos de los usuarios individuales. Esto hace que sean más precisos a la hora de predecir lo que escribirá un usuario. Sin embargo, cuando un usuario nuevo se une a una plataforma y no hay suficiente texto disponible, es más difícil crear modelos lingüísticos personalizados eficaces. Proponemos una solución para este problema, utilizando un modelo entrenado en usuarios que son similares a un usuario nuevo. En este artículo, exploramos estrategias para encontrar la similitud entre los nuevos usuarios y los existentes y métodos para usar los datos de los usuarios existentes que coinciden bien. Exploramos más a fondo el equilibrio entre los datos disponibles para los nuevos usuarios y la forma en que se puede modelar su idioma.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques personnalisés sont conçus et formés pour capturer des modèles linguistiques spécifiques à chaque utilisateur. Cela les rend plus précis dans la prédiction de ce qu'un utilisateur va écrire. Cependant, lorsqu'un nouvel utilisateur rejoint une plateforme et qu'il n'y a pas assez de texte disponible, il est plus difficile de créer des modèles linguistiques personnalisés efficaces. Nous proposons une solution à ce problème, en utilisant un modèle formé sur des utilisateurs similaires à un nouvel utilisateur. Dans cet article, nous explorons des stratégies pour trouver la similitude entre les nouveaux utilisateurs et les utilisateurs existants, ainsi que des méthodes d'utilisation des données d'utilisateurs existants qui correspondent bien. Nous explorons également le compromis entre les données disponibles pour les nouveaux utilisateurs et la qualité de la modélisation de leur langue.", 'ja': 'パーソナライズされた言語モデルは、個々のユーザー固有の言語パターンをキャプチャするように設計され、トレーニングされています。これにより、ユーザーが何を書くかを予測するのがより正確になります。しかし、新しいユーザーがプラットフォームに参加し、十分なテキストが利用できない場合、効果的なパーソナライズされた言語モデルを構築するのはより困難です。新規ユーザーに類似したユーザー向けのモデルを使用して、この問題の解決策を提案します。本稿では、新規ユーザーと既存ユーザーの類似性を求めるための戦略と、マッチングの良い既存ユーザーのデータを利用するための手法について考察する。私たちは、新規ユーザーの利用可能なデータと、彼らの言語をどの程度うまくモデル化できるかとの間のトレードオフをさらに探ります。', 'hi': 'व्यक्तिगत भाषा मॉडल को व्यक्तिगत उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए विशिष्ट भाषा पैटर्न को कैप्चर करने के लिए डिज़ाइन और प्रशिक्षित किया गया है। यह उन्हें भविष्यवाणी करने में अधिक सटीक बनाता है कि उपयोगकर्ता क्या लिखेगा। हालांकि, जब कोई नया उपयोगकर्ता एक प्लेटफ़ॉर्म में शामिल होता है और पर्याप्त पाठ उपलब्ध नहीं होता है, तो प्रभावी व्यक्तिगत भाषा मॉडल बनाना कठिन होता है। हम इस समस्या के लिए एक समाधान का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, उपयोगकर्ताओं पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल का उपयोग करके जो एक नए उपयोगकर्ता के समान हैं। इस पेपर में, हम नए उपयोगकर्ताओं और मौजूदा लोगों के बीच समानता खोजने के लिए रणनीतियों का पता लगाते हैं और मौजूदा उपयोगकर्ताओं से डेटा का उपयोग करने के तरीकों का पता लगाते हैं जो एक अच्छा मैच हैं। हम आगे नए उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए उपलब्ध डेटा के बीच व्यापार-बंद का पता लगाते हैं और उनकी भाषा को कितनी अच्छी तरह से मॉडलकिया जा सकता है।', 'zh': '个性化言语模范,以获特定于单用户之语。 此其占候用户将何以正之。 然当新用户入平台并无足用时,难为个性化语。 发一解决方案,习于新用户之用户。 本文寻新用户与现有用户相似性之策,及用自匹用户之数。 更论新用户可数语建模权衡。', 'ru': 'Персонализированные языковые модели разрабатываются и обучаются для того, чтобы фиксировать языковые паттерны, характерные для отдельных пользователей. Это делает их более точными в прогнозировании того, что пользователь будет писать. Однако, когда новый пользователь присоединяется к платформе и недостаточно текста, сложнее построить эффективные персонализированные языковые модели. Мы предлагаем решение этой проблемы, используя модель, обученную на пользователях, которые похожи на нового пользователя. В данной работе мы исследуем стратегии нахождения сходства между новыми пользователями и существующими и методы использования данных существующих пользователей, которые хорошо подходят друг другу. Мы далее изучаем компромисс между имеющимися данными для новых пользователей и тем, насколько хорошо можно смоделировать их язык.', 'ga': 'Deartar agus cuirtear oiliúint ar mhúnlaí teanga pearsantaithe chun patrúin teanga a bhaineann go sonrach le húsáideoirí aonair a ghabháil. Déanann sé seo iad níos cruinne agus iad ag tuar cad a scríobhfaidh úsáideoir. Mar sin féin, nuair a théann úsáideoir nua isteach in ardán agus nuair nach mbíonn a dhóthain téacs ar fáil, bíonn sé níos deacra samhlacha teanga pearsantaithe éifeachtacha a thógáil. Molaimid réiteach don fhadhb seo, ag baint úsáide as múnla atá oilte ar úsáideoirí atá cosúil le húsáideoir nua. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh ar straitéisí chun na cosúlachtaí idir úsáideoirí nua agus úsáideoirí atá ann cheana a aimsiú agus modhanna chun sonraí a úsáid ó úsáideoirí atá ann cheana ar meaits maith iad. Déanaimid iniúchadh breise ar an gcomhbhabhtáil idir na sonraí atá ar fáil d’úsáideoirí nua agus cé chomh maith agus is féidir a dteanga a mhúnlú.', 'ka': 'პროცენალური ენის მოდელები განაზღვრებულია და განაზღვრებულია, რომ ინდიველური მომხმარებისთვის სპექტიკური ენის მოდელების შესახებ. ეს მათ უფრო მარტივია, როგორც მომხმარებელი დაწერს. მაგრამ, როდესაც ახალი მომხმარებელი პლატატიფიკაში დაკავშირდება და არაფერი ტექსტის შესაძლებელია, უფრო რთული იქნება ეფექტიური პორციალური ენის მოდელ ჩვენ ამ პრობლემის გარეშე მინდომა, რომელიც ახალი მომხმარებისთვის მსგავსი მოდელის გამოყენება. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ სტრატიგიები გავაკეთებთ ახალი მომხმარებელი და მსგავსი მეთოდის შორის სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად ჩვენ ახალი მომხმარებისთვის შესაძლებელი მონაცემებისთვის და რამდენიმე მათი ენაზე შესაძლებელია მოდელირება.', 'hu': 'A személyre szabott nyelvi modelleket úgy tervezték és képezték, hogy rögzítsék az egyes felhasználók nyelvi mintáit. Ez teszi őket pontosabbá annak előrejelzésében, hogy egy felhasználó mit fog írni. Ha azonban egy új felhasználó csatlakozik egy platformhoz, és nem áll rendelkezésre elegendő szöveg, nehezebb hatékony, személyre szabott nyelvi modelleket építeni. Javasoljuk a megoldást erre a problémára, egy olyan modellt használva, amely hasonlít egy új felhasználóhoz. Jelen tanulmányban feltárjuk az új felhasználók és a meglévők hasonlóságának megtalálására irányuló stratégiákat, valamint a meglévő felhasználók adatainak felhasználására irányuló módszereket. Tovább vizsgáljuk az új felhasználók számára rendelkezésre álló adatok és a nyelvük modellezése közötti kereskedelmet.', 'el': 'Εξατομικευμένα μοντέλα γλώσσας σχεδιάζονται και εκπαιδεύονται για να συλλαμβάνουν γλωσσικά πρότυπα ειδικά για μεμονωμένους χρήστες. Αυτό τους καθιστά πιο ακριβείς στην πρόβλεψη του τι θα γράψει ένας χρήστης. Ωστόσο, όταν ένας νέος χρήστης εισέρχεται σε μια πλατφόρμα και δεν είναι διαθέσιμο αρκετό κείμενο, είναι δύσκολο να κατασκευαστούν αποτελεσματικά εξατομικευμένα μοντέλα γλώσσας. Προτείνουμε μια λύση για αυτό το πρόβλημα, χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο εκπαιδευμένο σε χρήστες που μοιάζουν με έναν νέο χρήστη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε στρατηγικές για την εύρεση της ομοιότητας μεταξύ νέων και υφιστάμενων χρηστών και μεθόδους για τη χρήση των δεδομένων από υφιστάμενους χρήστες που ταιριάζουν καλά. Εξετάζουμε περαιτέρω το συμβιβασμό μεταξύ των διαθέσιμων δεδομένων για νέους χρήστες και του πόσο καλά μπορεί να μοντελοποιηθεί η γλώσσα τους.', 'it': 'I modelli linguistici personalizzati sono progettati e formati per catturare modelli linguistici specifici per i singoli utenti. Questo li rende più precisi nel prevedere ciò che un utente scriverà. Tuttavia, quando un nuovo utente si unisce a una piattaforma e non è disponibile abbastanza testo, è più difficile costruire modelli linguistici personalizzati efficaci. Proponiamo una soluzione a questo problema, utilizzando un modello addestrato su utenti simili a un nuovo utente. In questo articolo esploriamo strategie per trovare la somiglianza tra nuovi utenti e quelli esistenti e metodi per utilizzare i dati degli utenti esistenti che sono una buona corrispondenza. Esploriamo ulteriormente il compromesso tra i dati disponibili per i nuovi utenti e quanto bene la loro lingua possa essere modellata.', 'mk': 'Персонализираните јазички модели се дизајнирани и обучени за зафатување јазички модели специфични за индивидуалните корисници. Ова ги прави попрецизни во предвидувањето на она што корисникот ќе пишува. Сепак, кога новиот корисник се приклучи на платформата и не е достапен доволно текст, потешко е да се изградат ефикасни персонализирани јазички модели. Ние предложуваме решение за овој проблем, користејќи модел обучен за корисниците кои се слични на новиот корисник. Во овој документ, истражуваме стратегии за пронаоѓање на сличноста помеѓу новите корисници и постојните и методите за користење на податоците од постојните корисници кои се добар совпаѓање. Понатаму ја истражуваме разликата помеѓу достапните податоци за новите корисници и колку добро нивниот јазик може да биде моделиран.', 'kk': 'Дербес тіл үлгілері жеке пайдаланушыларға ерекше тіл үлгілерін түсіру үшін құрылған және оқылған. Бұл пайдаланушының не жазылатынын көрсету үшін оларды дұрыс болады. Бірақ, жаңа пайдаланушы платформаға қосылған және мәтін жеткілікті емес болса, әсер етілген тіл үлгілерін құру үшін әсер етілмейді. Біз бұл мәселеге шешім керек, жаңа пайдаланушыға ұқсас етілген пайдаланушылар үлгісін қолдану үшін. Бұл қағазда, жаңа пайдаланушылар мен барлық пайдаланушылар мен әдістер арасындағы ұқсастығын табу стратегияларын іздейміз. Біз жаңа пайдаланушылар үшін бар деректер арасындағы жұмыс істеу және олардың тілі қанша жақсы үлгілеуге болады.', 'lt': 'Asmeniniai kalbų modeliai yra sukurti ir apmokyti atskiriems naudotojams būdingiems kalbų modeliams nustatyti. Tai daro juos tikslesnius nuspėjant, ką rašys naudotojas. Tačiau, kai naujas naudotojas prisijungia prie platformos ir nėra pakankamai teksto, sunkiau sukurti veiksmingus individualizuotus kalbos modelius. Siūlome išspręsti šią problem ą, naudodami model į, parengtą naudotojams, kurie yra panašūs į naują naudotoją. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjame strategijas, skirtas rasti naujų ir esamų naudotojų panašumą, ir esamų naudotojų, kurie yra tinkami, duomenų panašumą. Toliau tiriame galimybę suderinti turimus naujiems naudotojams skirtus duomenis su jų kalbos modeliavimu.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa peribadi direka dan dilatih untuk menangkap corak bahasa yang spesifik bagi pengguna individu. Ini membuat mereka lebih tepat dalam meramalkan apa yang akan ditulis pengguna. Namun, apabila pengguna baru menyertai platform dan tidak cukup teks tersedia, ia lebih sukar untuk membina model bahasa yang sesuai berkesan. Kami cadangkan penyelesaian untuk masalah ini, menggunakan model yang dilatih pada pengguna yang sama dengan pengguna baru. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi strategi untuk mencari persamaan antara pengguna baru dan pengguna yang ada dan kaedah untuk menggunakan data dari pengguna yang ada yang sesuai. Kami lebih lanjut mengeksplorasi perdagangan antara data yang tersedia untuk pengguna baru dan bagaimana bahasa mereka boleh dimodelkan dengan baik.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli lingwistiċi personalizzati huma ddisinjati u mħarrġa biex jinqabdu mudelli lingwistiċi speċifiċi għall-utenti individwali. Dan jagħmilhom aktar preċiżi fit-tbassir ta’ x’se jikteb utent. Madankollu, meta utent ġdid jingħaqad ma’ pjattaforma u ma jkunx hemm biżżejjed test disponibbli, huwa aktar diffiċli li jinbnew mudelli ta’ lingwa personalizzati effettivi. Aħna nipproponu soluzzjoni għal din il-problem a, billi nużaw mudell imħarreġ fuq l-utenti li huwa simili għal utent ġdid. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nesploraw strateġiji biex issib is-similarità bejn utenti ġodda u dawk eżistenti u metodi għall-użu tad-dejta minn utenti eżistenti li jaqblu tajjeb. Aħna nistudjaw aktar il-kompromess bejn id-dejta disponibbli għall-utenti l-ġodda u kemm il-lingwa tagħhom tista’ tiġi mmudellata tajjeb.', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിപരമായ ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു വ്യക്തിപരമായ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഭാഷ ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവ് എന്താണ് എഴുതുന്നതെന്ന് പ്രവചിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അത് അവര്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശദീകരിക് എന്നാലും ഒരു പുതിയ ഉപയോക്താവ് ഒരു പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dന്നാലും മതിയായ പദാവലി ലഭ്യമല്ലാതിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, പ്രാവര്\u200dത് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ഒരു പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. പുതിയ ഉപയോക്താവിനോട് പോല ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കും നിലവിലുള്ള ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള പോലെയുള്ള ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കും വിവരങ് പുതിയ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഇടയിലുള്ള വ്യാപാരം നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Хувь хэл загварууд нь хэл загваруудыг хэрэглэгчдийн тухай тодорхой хэл загваруудыг авахад зориулан болон сургалтын загварууд юм. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчийн юу бичих вэ гэдгийг тодорхойлж чаддаг. Гэхдээ шинэ хэрэглэгч платформад холбогдож, хангалттай текст байхгүй үед хувийн хэл загваруудыг бүтээх нь илүү хэцүү. Бид энэ асуудлыг шинэ хэрэглэгчидтэй адилхан загварыг ашиглан шинэ асуудлын шийдэл гаргаж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ хэрэглэгчид болон оршин байгаа хэрэглэгчид болон арга замыг ашиглах стратегийг судалж байна. Бид шинэ хэрэглэгчийн мэдээллийн хоорондох худалдааны хоорондохыг судалж, хэл хэрхэн загварчлах боломжтой вэ?', 'no': 'Personaliserte språk- modeller er designert og trent for å henta språk- mønsterelement spesifikke for individuelle brukarar. Dette gjer dei meir nøyaktige ved å forventa kva ein brukar skal skriva. Men når ein ny brukar koplar til eit plattform og ikkje nok tekst er tilgjengeleg, er det vanskeleg å bygge effektiv personaliserte språk-modeller. Vi foreslår eit løysing for dette problemet ved å bruka eit modell trent på brukarar som er liknande til ein ny brukar. I denne papiret utforskar vi strategiar for å finna ulikheten mellom nye brukarar og eksisterande metodar og metodar for å bruka data frå eksisterande brukarar som er ein god treff. Vi undersøker utviklinga mellom tilgjengelege data for nye brukarar og kor godt språket dei kan modelerast.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice personalizate sunt concepute și instruite pentru a capta modele lingvistice specifice utilizatorilor individuali. Acest lucru le face mai exacte la prezicerea ceea ce va scrie un utilizator. Cu toate acestea, atunci când un utilizator nou se alătură unei platforme și nu este disponibil suficient text, este mai greu de construit modele lingvistice personalizate eficiente. Propunem o soluție pentru această problemă, folosind un model instruit pe utilizatori care sunt similare cu un nou utilizator. În această lucrare, explorăm strategii de găsire a similitudinii dintre utilizatorii noi și cei existenți și metode de utilizare a datelor de la utilizatorii existenți care se potrivesc bine. Explorăm în continuare compromisul dintre datele disponibile pentru noii utilizatori și modul în care limba lor poate fi modelată.', 'pl': 'Personalizowane modele językowe są projektowane i przeszkolone w celu uchwycenia wzorców językowych specyficznych dla poszczególnych użytkowników. Dzięki temu są bardziej dokładne w przewidywaniu tego, co napisze użytkownik. Jednak gdy nowy użytkownik dołącza do platformy i nie jest dostępny wystarczająco dużo tekstu, trudniej jest zbudować skuteczne spersonalizowane modele językowe. Proponujemy rozwiązanie tego problemu, wykorzystując model przeszkolony na użytkownikach podobnych do nowego użytkownika. W niniejszym artykule badamy strategie znalezienia podobieństwa pomiędzy nowymi i istniejącymi użytkownikami oraz metody wykorzystywania danych od istniejących użytkowników, którzy są dobrze dopasowani. Ponadto badamy kompromis między dostępnymi danymi dla nowych użytkowników a możliwością modelowania ich języka.', 'so': 'Tusaalada luuqada ee shakhsiyeed waxaa loo qoraa oo lagu baraa in loo qabsado noocyada luuqada oo gaar ah isticmaalayaasha gaarka ah. Taas waxay ka dhigtaa inay si aad u fududaato ka sii ogaato waxa uu qori doono isticmaale. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka uu isticmaale cusub ku biiriyo qoraal sax ah oo uusan ku filnayn qoraal, waa adag tahay in la dhiso qaababka luuqada ee shaqsiyaadka ah. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa xal u gaaristan dhibaatadan, tusaale ahaan lagu tababaray isticmaalayaasha u eg isticmaalaha cusub. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baaraynaa qoraal aan helno isku mid ah oo u dhexeeya isticmaalayaasha cusub iyo qaababka ay jiraan iyo isticmaalka macluumaadka isticmaalayaasha joogta ee u eg isku mid ah. Sidoo kale ayaannu u baaraynaa macluumaadka la xiriira ganacsiga ee isticmaalayaasha cusub iyo sidoo kale si fiican looga sameyn karo luuqadooda.', 'si': 'පෞද්ගලික භාෂා මොඩේල් සැලසුම් කරලා හා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා භාෂා පෙට්ටර් අල්ලගන්න විශේෂ මේකෙන් ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක් ලියන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා. නමුත්, අළුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙක් ප්\u200dලේටෆ්ටෝම් එකට එකතු වෙලා හිටියොත් පාළුවක් පුළුවන් නැති විදියට, ප්\u200d අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, අලුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනකයෙක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරය මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අලුත් පාවිච්චිකරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවරුවර අපි අළුත් පාවිච්චිකරුවන්ට පුළුවන් දත්ත අතර පරික්ෂා කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ගේ භාෂාව මොනාද', 'sr': 'Oslobođeni jezički modeli su dizajnirani i obučeni da uhvate jezičke obrasce posebne za pojedinačne korisnike. To ih čini tačnijim predviđanjem šta će korisnik pisati. Međutim, kad se novi korisnik pridruži platformi i nije dovoljno teksta dostupno, teže je izgraditi efikasne personalizovane jezičke modele. Predlažemo rešenje za ovaj problem, koristeći model obučen na korisnike koji su slični novom korisniku. U ovom papiru istražujemo strategije za pronalaženje sličnosti između novih korisnika i postojećih i metoda za upotrebu podataka od postojećih korisnika koji su dobri odgovarajući. Dalje istražujemo trgovinu između dostupnih podataka za nove korisnike i koliko dobro njihov jezik može biti modeliran.', 'sv': 'Anpassade språkmodeller är utformade och utbildade för att fånga språkmönster som är specifika för enskilda användare. Detta gör dem mer exakta på att förutsäga vad en användare kommer att skriva. Men när en ny användare ansluter sig till en plattform och inte tillräckligt med text finns tillgänglig är det svårare att bygga effektiva personaliserade språkmodeller. Vi föreslår en lösning på detta problem genom att använda en modell utbildad på användare som liknar en ny användare. I denna uppsats undersöker vi strategier för att hitta likhet mellan nya användare och befintliga samt metoder för att använda data från befintliga användare som är en bra matchning. Vi undersöker vidare avvägningen mellan tillgängliga data för nya användare och hur väl deras språk kan modelleras.', 'ta': 'தனிப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரிகள் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது தனிப்பட்ட பயனர்களுக்கு குறி இது பயனர் என்ன எழுதுவார்கள் என்பதை முன்வெளிப்படுத்துவதில் அவர்களை அதிக சரியாக்குகிறது. ஆனால், புதிய பயனர் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையில் சேர்க்கும் போது போதுமான உரையை கிடைக்காமலும் இருந்தாலும், செயல்படுத்தப்படு இந்த பிரச்சனைக்கான தீர்வு நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், புதிய பயனருக்கு பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி பயிற் இந்த காகிதத்தில், புதிய பயனர்கள் மற்றும் இருக்கும் மற்றும் முறைகளில் உள்ள தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கான முறைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க நாம் தேடு நாம் புதிய பயனர்களுக்கு இடையில் இருக்கும் தரவுகளுக்கு இடையே வணிக ஒப்பந்தம் தேடுகிறோம் மற்றும் அவர்களுடை', 'ur': 'شخصی زبان موڈل کی طراحی کی گئی ہے اور تعلیم کی گئی ہے کہ زبان پٹرنے کے لئے ایک شخصی کارساز کے لئے خاص طراحی کی گئی ہیں۔ یہ ان کو دقیق بناتا ہے کہ کارساز کیا لکھے گا۔ However, when a new user joins a platform and not enough text available, it is harder to build effective personalized language models. ہم اس مسئلہ کے لئے ایک حل پیش کریں گے، ایک نمڈل استعمال کریں جو نیا کارساز کے برابر ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نئی کارساز اور موجود کارساز کے درمیان اور طریقے کے مطابق موجود کارساز سے ڈیٹا استعمال کرنے کے لئے استراتژی تلاش کرتے ہیں جو اچھے مطابق ہیں. ہم اس سے زیادہ مطابق نو کارساز کے لئے موجود ڈیٹا کے درمیان تجارت آف کی تلاش کرتے ہیں اور ان کی زبان کیسے اچھی طرح مدل کر سکتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Shaxsiy tillar modellari qo'llaniladi va foydalanuvchiga tayyorlangan tilning shakllarini qabul qilish uchun ishlatiladi. Bu ularni foydalanuvchi nima yozib qo'ydigan oldini ko'rsatish mumkin. However, when a new user joins a platform and not enough text is available, it is harder to build effective personalized language models.  @ info Bu hujjatda, biz yangi foydalanuvchilar va mavjud boʻlgan foydalanuvchilar va mavjud boʻlgan foydalanuvchidan foydalanuvchilardan foydalanish uchun bir xil usullarni qidirish. Biz yangi foydalanuvchilar uchun mavjud maʼlumotlar orasidagi soʻzni ko'rib chiqimiz va tilning tili qanday yaxshi shaklga oshirishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Cách mô hình ngôn ngữ tự chọn được thiết kế và huấn luyện để thu thập các mô hình ngôn ngữ đặc biệt đối với người dùng. Điều này làm họ chính xác hơn trong việc dự đoán những gì người dùng sẽ viết. Tuy nhiên, khi một người dùng mới gia nhập một bục và không có đủ văn bản, khó xây dựng những mô hình ngôn ngữ cá nhân hiệu quả hơn. Chúng tôi đề xuất một giải pháp cho vấn đề này, sử dụng một mẫu được huấn luyện về người dùng tương tự với người dùng mới. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tìm hiểu các chiến lược để tìm ra sự tương đồng giữa những người dùng mới và những người dùng đã sử dụng và các phương pháp để sử dụng dữ liệu từ người dùng đã có, những người phù hợp với nhau. Chúng ta sẽ tìm hiểu thêm về sự phân chia giữa dữ liệu có sẵn cho người dùng mới và cách mô hình ngôn ngữ của họ.', 'bg': 'Персонализираните езикови модели са проектирани и обучени да улавят езикови модели, специфични за отделните потребители. Това ги прави по-точни в предвиждането на това, което потребителят ще напише. Въпреки това, когато нов потребител се присъедини към платформа и няма достатъчно текст, е по-трудно да се изградят ефективни персонализирани езикови модели. Предлагаме решение на този проблем, като използваме модел, обучен върху потребители, които са подобни на нов потребител. В настоящата статия изследваме стратегии за намиране на сходство между нови и съществуващи потребители и методи за използване на данните от съществуващи потребители, които са добро съвпадение. Проучваме допълнително компромиса между наличните данни за нови потребители и колко добре може да бъде моделиран техният език.', 'nl': 'Gepersonaliseerde taalmodellen zijn ontworpen en getraind om taalpatronen vast te leggen die specifiek zijn voor individuele gebruikers. Dit maakt ze nauwkeuriger in het voorspellen van wat een gebruiker zal schrijven. Wanneer een nieuwe gebruiker zich echter aansluit bij een platform en er niet genoeg tekst beschikbaar is, is het moeilijker om effectieve gepersonaliseerde taalmodellen te bouwen. We stellen een oplossing voor dit probleem voor, met behulp van een model getraind op gebruikers die vergelijkbaar zijn met een nieuwe gebruiker. In dit artikel onderzoeken we strategieën voor het vinden van de overeenkomst tussen nieuwe en bestaande gebruikers en methoden voor het gebruik van de gegevens van bestaande gebruikers die een goede match zijn. We onderzoeken verder de afweging tussen beschikbare gegevens voor nieuwe gebruikers en hoe goed hun taal kan worden gemodelleerd.', 'da': 'Personaliserede sprogmodeller er designet og trænet til at fange sprogmønstre, der er specifikke for individuelle brugere. Dette gør dem mere præcise til at forudsige, hvad en bruger vil skrive. Men når en ny bruger slutter sig til en platform, og der ikke er nok tekst tilgængelig, er det sværere at opbygge effektive personlige sprogmodeller. Vi foreslår en løsning på dette problem ved hjælp af en model trænet på brugere, der ligner en ny bruger. I denne artikel undersøger vi strategier til at finde ligheden mellem nye og eksisterende brugere og metoder til at bruge data fra eksisterende brugere, der passer godt sammen. Vi undersøger yderligere afvejningen mellem tilgængelige data for nye brugere og hvor godt deres sprog kan modelleres.', 'hr': 'Osobni jezički modeli su dizajnirani i obučeni kako bi uhvatili jezičke uzorke posebne za pojedinačne korisnike. To ih čini preciznijim u predviđanju što će korisnik pisati. Međutim, kad se novi korisnik pridruži platformi i nije dosta teksta dostupno, teže je izgraditi učinkovite osobne jezičke modele. Predlažemo rješenje za ovaj problem, koristeći model obučen na korisnike koji su slični novom korisniku. U ovom papiru istražujemo strategije za pronalaženje sličnosti između novih korisnika i postojećih i metoda za upotrebu podataka od postojećih korisnika koji su dobri odgovarajući. Dalje istražujemo trgovinu između dostupnih podataka za nove korisnike i kako dobro njihov jezik može biti modeliran.', 'de': 'Personalisierte Sprachmodelle werden entwickelt und trainiert, um Sprachmuster für einzelne Benutzer zu erfassen. Dies macht sie genauer in der Vorhersage, was ein Benutzer schreiben wird. Wenn jedoch ein neuer Benutzer einer Plattform beitritt und nicht genügend Text verfügbar ist, ist es schwieriger, effektive personalisierte Sprachmodelle zu erstellen. Wir schlagen eine Lösung für dieses Problem vor, indem wir ein Modell verwenden, das auf Benutzer trainiert wird, die einem neuen Benutzer ähnlich sind. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir Strategien, um die Ähnlichkeit zwischen neuen und bestehenden Benutzern zu finden und Methoden zur Verwendung der Daten von bestehenden Benutzern, die gut zusammenpassen. Wir untersuchen weiter den Kompromiss zwischen verfügbaren Daten für neue Benutzer und wie gut ihre Sprache modelliert werden kann.', 'id': 'Model bahasa pribadi dirancang dan dilatih untuk menangkap pola bahasa yang spesifik bagi pengguna individu. Ini membuat mereka lebih akurat dalam memprediksi apa yang akan ditulis pengguna. Namun, ketika pengguna baru bergabung dengan platform dan tidak cukup teks tersedia, lebih sulit untuk membangun model bahasa pribadi yang efektif. Kami mengusulkan solusi untuk masalah ini, menggunakan model yang dilatih pada pengguna yang mirip dengan pengguna baru. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengeksplorasi strategi untuk menemukan persamaan antara pengguna baru dan yang ada dan metode untuk menggunakan data dari pengguna yang ada yang cocok. Kami lebih lanjut mengeksplorasi perdagangan antara data yang tersedia untuk pengguna baru dan seberapa baik bahasa mereka dapat dimodel.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa lugha binafsi unaundwa na mafunzo ya kuchukua miundo maalum kwa watumiaji binafsi. Hii inawafanya kuwa sahihi zaidi kutabiri nini mtumiaji ataandika. However, when a new user joins a platform and not enough text is available, it is harder to build effective personalized language models.  Tunazipendekeza suluhisho la tatizo hili, kwa kutumia mifano inayofundishwa kwa watumiaji ambao wanafanana na mtumiaji mpya. Katika gazeti hili, tunatafuta mbinu za kutafuta sawa kati ya watumiaji wapya na njia zilizopo na njia za kutumia taarifa kutoka kwa watumiaji waliopo ambao ni mpya wa kampeni nzuri. Tunaendelea kuchunguza biashara kati ya taarifa zinazopatikana kwa watumiaji wapya na jinsi lugha yao inavyoweza kutengenezwa vizuri.', 'ko': '개성화된 언어 모델의 디자인과 훈련은 개인 사용자에게 특정된 언어 모델을 포착하기 위한 것이다.이것은 그들로 하여금 사용자가 무엇을 쓸지 더욱 정확하게 예측하게 한다.그러나 새로운 사용자가 플랫폼에 가입하고 충분한 텍스트가 없으면 효과적인 개성화된 언어 모델을 구축하기 어렵다.우리는 이 문제에 대해 해결 방안을 제시했고 새로운 사용자와 비슷한 사용자 교육 모델을 사용했다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 사용자와 기존 사용자 간의 유사성을 찾는 전략, 그리고 기존 사용자 데이터를 사용하는 방법을 연구했다.우리는 새로운 사용자가 사용할 수 있는 데이터와 그들의 언어 모델링 능력 간의 균형을 더욱 연구했다.', 'sq': 'Modelet e personalizuara të gjuhës janë projektuar dhe trajnuar për të kapur modele gjuhësh specifike për përdoruesit individual ë. Kjo i bën at a më të saktë në parashikimin e çfarë do të shkruajë një përdorues. Megjithatë, kur një përdorues i ri bashkohet me një platform ë dhe nuk ka mjaft tekst në dispozicion, është më e vështirë të ndërtohen modele gjuhësh të personalizuara efektive. Ne propozojmë një zgjidhje për këtë problem, duke përdorur një model të trajnuar për përdoruesit që janë të ngjashëm me një përdorues të ri. In this paper, we explore strategies for finding the similarity between new users and existing ones and methods for using the data from existing users who are a good match.  Ne eksplorojmë më tej kompromisin midis të dhënave të disponueshme për përdoruesit e rinj dhe sa mirë mund të modelohet gjuha e tyre.', 'tr': 'Şahsy dil nusgalary birnäçe Ullançylar üçin dil nusgalary çekmek we eğlenmek üçin tasarlanýar. Bu olaryň qullanaryň näme ýazmagyny tahmin etmegine has dogrylyklygyny edip bilýär. Ýöne, täze bir ulançy plataforma goşulýand a, we ýeterlik metin bar bolmasa, täsirli şahsy dil nusgalary gurmak kyn. Biz bu mesele üçin çözüm teklip edip, täze Ullançylara meňzeş bir nusga ullanýarys. Bu kagyzda, täze ulanylar we bar ulanylar arasyndaky meňzeşlik we gowy oýun ulanylar üçin maglumatlary tapmak üçin strategiýalary keşfedýäris. Biz täze ulananlar üçin ulaşan maglumatyň arasyndaky daşyny we dilleriniň nähili gowy modelleşdirilip bilýändigini keşfedýäris.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ለሁሉም ተጠቃሚዎች የተለየ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመያዝ እና የተማሩ ናቸው፡፡ ይህ ተጠቃሚው ምን እንደሚጻፍበት ለማሳየት ይጨመርላቸዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን አዲስ ተጠቃሚው ፕላጦማር በተጠቃሚ ጽሑፍ ያልተገኘ ጊዜ፣ የተግባር የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመሥራት በጣም ችግር ነው፡፡ አዲስ ተጠቃሚ በሚመስሉ ተጠቃሚዎች ላይ የተጠቃሚ ሞዴል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ In this paper, we explore strategies for finding the similarity between new users and existing ones and methods for using the data from existing users who are a good match.  አዲስ ተጠቃሚዎች እና ቋንቋቸው እንዴት ያህል ይደረጋል ብለን እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Անձնական լեզվի մոդելները նախագծված են և պատրաստված լեզվի կաղապարների ձայնագրման համար, որոնք հատուկ են անհատական օգտագործողներին: Սա ստիպում է նրանց ավելի ճշգրիտ կանխատեսել, թե ինչ կգրի օգտագործողը: However, when a new user joins a platform and not enough text is available, it is harder to build effective personalized language models.  Մենք առաջարկում ենք լուծում այս խնդիրը, օգտագործելով նոր օգտագործողի նման վարժեցված մոդել: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նոր օգտագործողների և գոյություն ունեցող օգտագործողների և գոյություն ունեցող օգտագործողների տվյալներ օգտագործելու մեթոդներ, որոնք լավ համապատասխանում են: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք նոր օգտագործողների համար հասանելի տվյալների միջև առևտրային հարաբերությունները և նրանց լեզվի մոդելը:', 'az': 'Şahsiyleşdirilmiş dil modelləri indir istifadəçilərə müəyyən dil modellərini tutmaq və təhsil edilir. Bu onları istifadəçinin nəyi yazacağını təmin edir. Lakin, yeni istifadəçi bir platform a qoşulduğunda və yeterli metin faydalanmadığı zaman, təkcə kişisel dil modellerini inşa etmək daha çətin. Biz bu problemin çözümünü təklif edirik, yeni istifadəçilərə bənzəyən modeli istifadəçilərə istifadə edilir. Bu kağızda, yeni istifadəçilər və mövcud istifadəçilər arasındakı məlumatları və metodları istifadə etmək üçün müxtəlif istifadəçilərdən istifadə etmək üçün stratejikləri keşif edirik. Biz yeni istifadəçilər üçün mümkün verilən məlumatlar arasındakı ticarəti və dillərinin modelləri necə yaxşı olaraq keşfetirik.', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিগত ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য নির্দিষ্ট ভাষার প্যাটার গ্রহণ করা এবং প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়। This makes them more accurate at predicting what a user will write.  তবে যখন একটি নতুন ব্যবহারকারী প্ল্যাটফর্মে যোগ দেয় এবং যথেষ্ট ট টেক্সট পাওয়া যায় না, তখন কার্যকর ভাষায় ব্যক্তিগত ভাষার মডেল তৈ আমরা এই সমস্যার জন্য একটি সমাধান প্রস্তাব করি, নতুন ব্যবহারকারীর মতো একটি মডেল প্রশিক্ষিত ব্যবহারকারীদের ব্যবহার করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নতুন ব্যবহারকারী এবং বিদ্যমান ব্যবহারকারীদের মধ্যে একই ধরনের কৌশল খুঁজে বের করি এবং বিদ্যমান ব্যবহারকারীদের তথ্য ব্যবহার করা আমরা নতুন ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য ব্যবহৃত তথ্যের মধ্যে ব্যাবসার বিষয়টি আরো খুঁজে বের করি এবং তাদের ভাষা কত ভালো ভাব', 'fa': 'مدلهای زبان شخصی طراحی شده و آموزش داده می\u200cشوند تا الگوهای زبان مخصوص برای کاربران شخصی بگیرند. این باعث میشه دقیق تر از پیش بینی کردن کاربر چه نوشته شود. ولی وقتی یک کاربر جدید به یک پلاکتر ملحق می شود و متن کافی در دسترس نیست، ساختن مدل زبان شخصی موثر سخت\u200cتر است. ما یک راه حل برای این مشکل پیشنهاد می کنیم، با استفاده از یک مدل آموزش داده شده بر کاربران که شبیه یک کاربران جدید هستند. در این کاغذ، ما استراتژی\u200cها را برای پیدا کردن شبیه بین کاربران جدید و روش\u200cهای موجود و استفاده از داده\u200cها از کاربران موجود که مسابقه خوبی هستند تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما بیشتر تجارت بین داده های موجود برای کاربران جدید و چقدر خوب زبانشان می تواند مدل شود، تحقیق کنیم.', 'ca': "Els models de llenguatge personalitzats estan dissenyats i entrenats per capturar patrons de llenguatge específics per als usuaris individuals. Això els fa més precisos en predir què escriurà un usuari. Però quan un nou usuari s'unia a una plataforma i no hi ha suficient text disponible, és més difícil construir models de llenguatge personalitzats efectius. Proposem una solució a aquest problema, utilitzant un model entrenat en usuaris semblants a un nou usuari. En aquest paper, explorem estratègies per trobar la similitud entre els nous usuaris i els existents i mètodes per utilitzar les dades dels usuaris existents que són una bona coincidencia. We further explore the trade-off between available data for new users and how well their language can be modeled.", 'cs': 'Personalizované jazykové modely jsou navrženy a školeny tak, aby zachytily jazykové vzorce specifické pro jednotlivé uživatele. To je přesnější při předpovídání toho, co uživatel napíše. Pokud se však nový uživatel připojí k platformě a není k dispozici dostatek textu, je těžší vytvořit efektivní personalizované jazykové modely. Navrhujeme řešení tohoto problému s využitím modelu školeného na uživatele, kteří jsou podobní novému uživateli. V tomto článku zkoumáme strategie pro nalezení podobnosti mezi novými a stávajícími uživateli a metody pro využití dat od stávajících uživatelů, kteří se dobře shodují. Dále zkoumáme kompromis mezi dostupnými daty pro nové uživatele a dobrým modelováním jejich jazyka.', 'af': "Persoonaliseerde taal modelle word ontwerp en opgeleer om taal patrone spesifieke vir individuele gebruikers te vang. Hierdie maak hulle meer presies by voorskou wat 'n gebruiker sal skryf. Maar wanneer 'n nuwe gebruiker aansluit by 'n platform en nie genoeg teks beskikbaar is, is dit harder om effektief persooniseerde taal modele te bou. Ons voorstel 'n oplossing vir hierdie probleem, gebruik 'n model onderwerp op gebruikers wat gelyk is aan 'n nuwe gebruiker. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek strategies om die gelykenis te vind tussen nuwe gebruikers en bestaande een en metodes vir die gebruik van die data van bestaande gebruikers wat 'n goeie ooreenstemming is. Ons verder ondersoek die handeling tussen beskikbare data vir nuwe gebruikers en hoe goed kan hulle taal modelleer word.", 'et': 'Isiklikud keelemudelid on loodud ja koolitatud üksikutele kasutajatele spetsiifiliste keelemudelite jäädvustamiseks. See muudab nad täpsemaks ennustamisel, mida kasutaja kirjutab. Kuid kui platvormiga liitub uus kasutaja ja teksti ei ole piisavalt saadaval, on raskem luua tõhusaid isikupärastatud keelemudeleid. Me pakume välja selle probleemi lahenduse, kasutades mudelit, mis on koolitatud kasutajatele, kes on sarnased uue kasutajaga. Käesolevas töös uurime strateegiaid uute ja olemasolevate kasutajate sarnasuse leidmiseks ning meetodeid olemasolevate kasutajate andmete kasutamiseks, kes sobivad hästi. Lisaks uurime uutele kasutajatele kättesaadavate andmete ja nende keele modelleerimise vahelist kompromisse.', 'fi': 'Henkilökohtaiset kielimallit on suunniteltu ja koulutettu tallentamaan yksittäisille käyttäjille ominaisia kielimalleja. Tämä tekee niistä tarkempia ennustamaan, mitä käyttäjä kirjoittaa. Kun uusi käyttäjä liittyy alustaan ja tekstiä ei ole riittävästi saatavilla, on vaikeampaa rakentaa tehokkaita yksilöllisiä kielimalleja. Ehdotamme ratkaisua tähän ongelmaan käyttämällä mallia, joka on koulutettu käyttäjille, jotka ovat samanlaisia kuin uusi käyttäjä. Tässä artikkelissa selvitämme strategioita uusien käyttäjien ja nykyisten samankaltaisuuden löytämiseksi sekä menetelmiä nykyisten käyttäjien tietojen hyödyntämiseksi. Tutkimme myös uusien käyttäjien käytettävissä olevan datan välistä kompromissia ja sitä, miten hyvin heidän kielensä voidaan mallintaa.', 'bs': 'Oslobođeni jezički modeli su dizajnirani i obučeni da uhvate jezičke modele posebne za pojedinačne korisnike. To ih čini preciznijim u predviđanju šta će korisnik pisati. Međutim, kad se novi korisnik pridruži platformi i nije dosta teksta dostupno, teže je izgraditi efikasne personalizovane jezičke modele. Predlažemo rješenje ovog problem a, koristeći model obučen na korisnike koji su slični novom korisniku. U ovom papiru istražujemo strategije za pronalaženje sličnosti između novih korisnika i postojećih i metoda za upotrebu podataka od postojećih korisnika koji su dobri odgovarajući. Dalje istražujemo trgovinu između dostupnih podataka za nove korisnike i koliko dobro njihov jezik može biti modeliran.', 'he': 'דוגמני שפה אישיים מתוכננים ואומנים כדי לתפוס דפוסי שפה ספציפיים למשתמשים בודדים. זה עושה אותם מדויקים יותר בחזוי מה משתמש יכתוב. עם זאת, כאשר משתמש חדש מצטרף לפלטפורמה ולא מספיק טקסט זמין, קשה יותר לבנות דוגמנים לשפה אישיים יעילים. אנו מציעים פתרון לבעיה הזאת, בשימוש במודל מאומן על משתמשים שדומה למשתמש חדש. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו חוקרים אסטרטגיות למצוא את הדומה בין משתמשים חדשים ושיטות קיימות להשתמש במידע משתמשים קיימים אנו חוקרים יותר את הסחר בין נתונים זמינים למשתמשים חדשים וכמה טוב השפה שלהם יכולה להיות מודל.', 'ha': "An designe da misãlai na harshen wanda ke da ɗabi'a, kuma an sanar da su dõmin su kãma tsari na harshe masu ƙayyade wa masu amfani da guda. Wannan yana tsare su wajen gane abin da mai amfani da shi zai rubũta. However, when a new user joins a platform and not enough text is available, it is harder to build effective personalized language models.  Tuna goyyar da rabo wa wannan mataimaki, don mu yi amfani da wani misali wanda aka sanar da shi a kan mãsu amfani da shi wanda ke daidai da wani mai amfani da shi. Daga wannan takardan, munã ƙidãya masu gano taki kamar da ke samu a tsakanin mãsu amfani da masu amfani da waɗancan da ke gaba, da shiryoyin da za'a yi amfani da data daga masu amfani da wanda ke gaba, su sami mai daidai. Munã ƙara yin fatauta-farat tsakanin data na da ke da wa masu amfani da waɗancan, kuma don a sami misalinsu.", 'sk': 'Prilagojeni jezikovni modeli so zasnovani in usposobljeni za zajemanje jezikovnih vzorcev, specifičnih za posamezne uporabnike. To jih naredi natančnejše pri napovedovanju, kaj bo uporabnik napisal. Ko pa se nov uporabnik pridruži platformi in ni na voljo dovolj besedila, je težje ustvariti učinkovite personalizirane jezikovne modele. Predlagamo rešitev za ta problem z uporabo modela, usposobljenega za uporabnike, ki so podobni novemu uporabniku. V prispevku raziskujemo strategije za iskanje podobnosti med novimi in obstoječimi uporabniki ter metode uporabe podatkov obstoječih uporabnikov, ki se dobro ujemajo. Nadalje raziskujemo kompromis med razpoložljivimi podatki za nove uporabnike in kako dobro je mogoče modelirati njihov jezik.', 'jv': 'Monday model sing perdusé tindahan sampeyan nggawe lan kelas pengguna nggawe tresno adat karo perdusé. Digawe nggo wong liyane kabeh wektu nggo ngerasah panembang pengguna. Nanging, soalé gambar sistem sing nêmên nang sistem sing sampeyan lan ora sampeyan teks sing nêmên, lak susahe nggawe model sing luwih perusahaan. Awak dhéwé ngerasah perusahaan kanggo kelas iki, nggunakake model sing kudu nggawe pengguna sing ngejaraké karo pengguna empya. Nang pepulan iki, awak dhéwé isih staji kanggo ngilanggar alih dumadhi karo perusahaan anyar lan karo hal-hal kanggo nggambar dadi sabanjuré iki dadi sak pasar iki sing apik. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan kelas telas nang data sing berarti kanggo perusahaan anyar karo iso nggawe langkung saé bersên.', 'bo': 'སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དབྱེ་བ་ལ་འཛུགས འདིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་མི་ཞིག་གིས་ཅི་འབྲི་དགོས་པར་ངེས་པར་བདེན་བཤད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཙམ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གིས་Platform་ཅིག་མཐུད་པ ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་ཐབས་ཤེས་བྱེད་སྐབས་མགོ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གསར་པ་དང་། གནས་ཡོད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོའི་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱོད་མཁན ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གསར་པ་ལ་བརྗོད་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསརཔ་དང་ཅི་ལྟར་མང་ཙམ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ནི་'}
{'en': 'm', 'ar': 'عميق: التدريب المسبق للكيان المُنهي للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'pt': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pré-treinamento para Tradução Automática Neural', 'fr': "DEEP\xa0: Pré-formation de l'entité DeNoising pour la traduction automatique neuronale", 'es': 'DEEP: Preentrenamiento de entidades de eliminación de ruido para traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': 'ディープ：神経機械翻訳のためのDEnoising Entity事前トレーニング', 'zh': 'DEEP:神经机器翻译 DEnoising 习', 'hi': 'गहरी: DEnoising इकाई तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए पूर्व प्रशिक्षण', 'ru': 'ГЛУБОКИЙ: DEnoising Entity Предварительное обучение для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'DEEP: Réamhoiliúint Aonán DEnoising le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach', 'el': 'Βαθύ: Προεκπαίδευση Οντότητας για Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση', 'hu': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Előképzés Neurális Gépi Fordításhoz', 'ka': 'DEEP: წინასწარმოადგენების წინასწარმოადგენება ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგენისთვის', 'kk': 'DEEP: Нейрондық машинаның аудармасының алдын- ала оқыту', 'it': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-training per Neural Machine Translation', 'lt': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-training for Neural Machine Translation', 'ms': 'DEEP: Perlatihan Pra-pelatihan Entiti DENoising untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'ml': 'DEEP: നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള ഡെയോണിങ്ങ് എന്റിറ്റി പ്രെയിനിഷന്\u200d', 'mk': 'ДЕП: Преобука на ентитетот за дешумирање за превод на неврални машини', 'mn': 'ДЕЕП: Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалтын өмнө дасгал хөдөлгөөн', 'mt': 'DEEP: Taħriġ minn qabel ta’ Entità li Tnaqqas l-istorbju għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali', 'no': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'ro': 'DEEP: Dezgomot Entity Pre-training pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'pl': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-szkolenie do tłumaczenia maszynowego neuronu', 'sr': 'DEEP: Preobuka za neurološki prevod', 'sv': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-utbildning för neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'DEEP: நெயுரல் இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான DEnoising Entity Pre- training', 'so': 'DEEP: Waxbarashada u horumarinta Entity', 'si': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS', 'ur': 'DEEP: نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے نازل کرنے والی انٹیٹی پیشترکین', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-đào tạo for Neural Machine Translation', 'bg': 'Предварително обучение за неврален машинен превод на същества', 'hr': 'DEEP: Preobuka za neurološki prevod', 'da': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-training for Neural Machine Translation', 'nl': 'DEEP: Ontnoise Entity Voortraining voor Neural Machine Translation', 'de': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-Training für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'DEEP: Entitas DENoising Pre-training untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'ko': 'DEEP: 신경 기계 번역에 사용되는 소음 제거 실체 예비 훈련', 'fa': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'sw': 'DEEP: Tafsiri ya Mashindano ya Utamaduni', 'tr': 'DEEP', 'sq': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-training for Neural Machine Translation', 'af': 'Constellation name (optional)', 'am': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-training for Neural Machine Translation', 'hy': 'ԴԵՊ. Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման նախապատրաստ դասավորումը', 'az': 'DEEP: N칬ral Makina 칂evirm톛si 칲칞칲n f톛rqli Entity 칐n t톛hsil', 'bn': 'DEEP: নিউরাল মেশিনের অনুবাদের জন্য ডিওনিং এন্টিটি পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ', 'cs': 'DEEP: Přípravný výcvik pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Eelkoolitus neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Neural Machine Translation -esikoulutus', 'bs': 'DEEP: Preobuka za neurološki prevod', 'ca': "DEEP: Preentrenament d'una entitat desnoiosa per a la traducció de màquines neurals", 'jv': 'DEPP', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Predusposabljanje za strojno prevajanje nevronov', 'he': 'אימון מוקדם של יחידה מדבקת לתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'bo': 'DEEP: DEnoising Entity Pre-training for Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Recent studies have shown that multilingual pretrained language models can be effectively improved with cross-lingual alignment information from Wikipedia entities.However, existing methods only exploit entity information in pretraining and do not explicitly use entities in downstream tasks.In this study, we explore the effectiveness of leveraging entity representations for downstream cross-lingual tasks.We train a multilingual language model with 24 languages with entity representations and showthe model consistently outperforms word-based pretrained models in various cross-lingual transfer tasks.We also analyze the model and the key insight is that incorporating entity representations into the input allows us to extract more language-agnostic features.We also evaluate the model with a multilingual cloze prompt task with the mLAMA dataset.We show that entity-based prompt elicits correct factual knowledge more likely than using only word representations.', 'ar': 'لقد ثبت أن نماذج الترجمة الآلية عادة ما تولد ترجمات رديئة للكيانات المسماة والتي تكون نادرة في مجموعة التدريب. تركز طرق ترجمة الكيانات المسماة سابقًا بشكل أساسي على التحويل الصوتي الصوتي ، والذي يتجاهل سياق الجملة للترجمة ويقتصر على النطاق وتغطية اللغة. لمعالجة هذا القيد ، نقترح DEEP ، وهي طريقة تدريب ما قبل الكيان DEnoising تستفيد من كميات كبيرة من البيانات أحادية اللغة وقاعدة المعرفة لتحسين دقة ترجمة الكيانات المسماة داخل الجمل. إلى جانب ذلك ، نتحرى عن استراتيجية تعلم متعددة المهام تضع نموذجًا نهائيًا للترجمة الآلية العصبية المدربة مسبقًا على البيانات أحادية اللغة المعززة بالكيان والبيانات الموازية لزيادة تحسين ترجمة الكيانات. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على ثلاثة أزواج لغوية أن DEEP ينتج عنه تحسينات كبيرة على خطوط الأساس القوية للتشفير التلقائي ، مع زيادة تصل إلى 1.3 BLEU وما يصل إلى 9.2 نقاط دقة الكيان للترجمة الإنجليزية-الروسية.', 'es': 'Se ha demostrado que los modelos de traducción automática suelen generar traducciones deficientes para las entidades nombradas que son poco frecuentes en el corpus de capacitación. Los métodos de traducción de entidades nombradas anteriormente se centran principalmente en la transliteración fonética, que ignora el contexto de la oración para la traducción y tiene una cobertura limitada de dominio e idioma. Para abordar esta limitación, proponemos DEEP, un método de preentrenamiento de entidades de eliminación de ruido que aprovecha grandes cantidades de datos monolingües y una base de conocimientos para mejorar la precisión de la traducción de entidades nombradas dentro de las oraciones. Además, investigamos una estrategia de aprendizaje multitarea que ajusta un modelo de traducción automática neuronal previamente entrenado tanto en datos monolingües aumentados por entidad como en datos paralelos para mejorar aún más la traducción de entidades. Los resultados experimentales en tres pares de idiomas demuestran que DEEP produce mejoras significativas con respecto a las líneas base de codificación automática con fuerte eliminación de ruido, con una ganancia de hasta 1,3 BLEU y hasta 9,2 puntos de precisión de entidad para la traducción inglés-ruso.', 'fr': "Il a été démontré que les modèles de traduction automatique génèrent généralement de mauvaises traductions pour les entités nommées qui sont peu fréquentes dans le corpus de formation. Les méthodes de traduction d'entités nommées précédemment se concentrent principalement sur la translittération phonétique, qui ignore le contexte de la phrase pour la traduction et est limitée en termes de domaines et de langues. Pour remédier à cette limitation, nous proposons DEEP, une méthode de pré-formation des entités débruitées qui exploite de grandes quantités de données monolingues et une base de connaissances pour améliorer la précision de la traduction des entités nommées dans les phrases. En outre, nous étudions une stratégie d'apprentissage multitâche qui affine un modèle de traduction automatique neuronale pré-entraîné à la fois sur des données monolingues augmentées par des entités et des données parallèles afin d'améliorer davantage la traduction d'entités. Les résultats expérimentaux sur trois paires de langues démontrent que DEEP entraîne des améliorations significatives par rapport aux lignes de base de codage automatique fortement débruitées, avec un gain allant jusqu'à 1,3 BLEU et jusqu'à 9,2 points de précision d'entité pour la traduction anglais-russe.", 'pt': 'Foi demonstrado que os modelos de tradução automática geralmente geram traduções ruins para entidades nomeadas que não são frequentes no corpus de treinamento. Os métodos de tradução de entidade anteriormente nomeados concentram-se principalmente na transliteração fonética, que ignora o contexto da frase para tradução e é limitado na cobertura de domínio e idioma. Para resolver essa limitação, propomos o DEEP, um método de pré-treinamento de entidade DEnoising que aproveita grandes quantidades de dados monolíngues e uma base de conhecimento para melhorar a precisão da tradução de entidades nomeadas em frases. Além disso, investigamos uma estratégia de aprendizado multitarefa que ajusta um modelo de tradução automática neural pré-treinado em dados monolíngues aumentados de entidade e dados paralelos para melhorar ainda mais a tradução de entidade. Resultados experimentais em três pares de idiomas demonstram que o DEEP resulta em melhorias significativas em relação às linhas de base de autocodificação de forte redução de ruído, com um ganho de até 1,3 BLEU e até 9,2 pontos de precisão de entidade para tradução inglês-russo.', 'zh': '已证,机器翻译模常为训练语料库中不常见者名实体为差译。 早命实体译法主集语音音译上,忽译句上下文,而限以领域语言。 为此限者,DEEP也,DEnoising实体预训练方法,大单语数知识库,以重句名实体译之准确性。 又考一多任务学习策略,策增单语数,并行数调神经机器翻译,更进实体译。 三言之实验结果表明,比于强去噪自编码基线,DEEP有显进,英语 - 俄语译者增益1.3 BLEU与达9.2体正。', 'ja': '機械翻訳モデルは、通常、トレーニングコーパスで頻繁ではない名前付きエンティティのために不十分な翻訳を生成することが示されている。 先の命名されたエンティティ翻訳方法は、翻訳のための文脈を無視し、ドメインと言語のカバレッジに制限がある音声変換に主に焦点を当てています。 この制限に対処するために、DEEPは、大量のモノリンガルデータとナレッジベースを活用して、文内の名前付きエンティティ翻訳の精度を向上させるDEnoisingエンティティ事前トレーニング方法を提案します。 さらに、エンティティ拡張モノリンガルデータと並列データの両方に事前にトレーニングされたニューラルマシン翻訳モデルを微調整し、エンティティ翻訳をさらに改善するマルチタスク学習戦略を調査します。 3つの言語ペアの実験結果は、深い結果が強力な脱騒音自動エンコードベースラインよりも有意な改善をもたらし、最大1.3 BLEUの利得と、英語-ロシア語翻訳の最大9.2エンティティ精度ポイントをもたらすことを示しています。', 'hi': 'यह दिखाया गया है कि मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल आमतौर पर नामित संस्थाओं के लिए खराब अनुवाद उत्पन्न करते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस में दुर्लभ हैं। पहले नामित इकाई अनुवाद विधियां मुख्य रूप से ध्वन्यात्मक लिप्यंतरण पर ध्यान केंद्रित करती हैं, जो अनुवाद के लिए वाक्य संदर्भ को अनदेखा करती है और डोमेन और भाषा कवरेज में सीमित है। इस सीमा को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम DEEP का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, एक DEnoising एंटिटी प्री-ट्रेनिंग विधि जो बड़ी मात्रा में मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा और वाक्यों के भीतर नामित इकाई अनुवाद सटीकता में सुधार करने के लिए एक नॉलेज बेस का लाभ उठाती है। इसके अलावा, हम एक बहु-कार्य सीखने की रणनीति की जांच करते हैं जो इकाई अनुवाद को और बेहतर बनाने के लिए इकाई-संवर्धित मोनोलिंगुअल डेटा और समानांतर डेटा दोनों पर एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल को ठीक करता है। तीन भाषा जोड़े पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि DEEP के परिणामस्वरूप मजबूत denoising ऑटो-एन्कोडिंग बेसलाइन पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार होते हैं, जिसमें 1.3 BLEU तक का लाभ होता है और अंग्रेजी-रूसी अनुवाद के लिए 9.2 इकाई सटीकता बिंदु तक होता है।', 'ru': 'Было показано, что модели машинного перевода обычно генерируют плохие переводы для именованных сущностей, которые редко встречаются в обучающем корпусе. Ранее именованные методы перевода сущностей в основном фокусируются на фонетической транслитерации, которая игнорирует контекст предложения для перевода и ограничена по охвату домена и языка. Чтобы устранить это ограничение, мы предлагаем ГЛУБОКИЙ метод предварительного обучения для удаления шумов, который использует большие объемы одноязычных данных и базу знаний для улучшения точности перевода именованных сущностей в предложениях. Кроме того, мы исследуем многозадачную стратегию обучения, которая настраивает предварительно обученную модель нейронного машинного перевода как на монолингвальные данные с расширением сущности, так и на параллельные данные для дальнейшего улучшения перевода сущности. Экспериментальные результаты по трем языковым парам демонстрируют, что ГЛУБОКИЕ результаты приводят к значительным улучшениям по сравнению с сильным шумоподавлением базовых линий автокодирования с усилением до 1,3 BLEU и до 9,2 точек точности сущности для английско-русского перевода.', 'ga': 'Tá sé léirithe gur gnách go ngineann múnlaí meaisínaistriúcháin aistriúcháin laga d’eintitis ainmnithe nach minic a bhíonn sa chorpas oiliúna. Díríonn modhanna aistriúcháin aonáin ainmnithe níos luaithe go príomha ar thraslitriú foghraíochta, a dhéanann neamhaird de chomhthéacs na habairte don aistriúchán agus atá teoranta ó thaobh clúdach fearainn agus teanga. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an teorannú seo, molaimid DEEP, modh Réamh-oiliúna Aonáin DEnoising a ghiaráil méid mór sonraí aonteangacha agus bonn eolais chun cruinneas aistriúcháin aonáin ainmnithe laistigh de abairtí a fheabhsú. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar straitéis foghlama il-tasc a mhionchoinníonn múnla néaraistriúcháin meaisín réamh-oilte ar shonraí aonteangacha méadaithe aonáin agus ar shonraí comhthreomhara chun aistriúchán aonáin a fheabhsú tuilleadh. Léiríonn torthaí trialacha ar thrí phéire teanga go mbíonn feabhsuithe suntasacha mar thoradh ar DEEP ar bhunlínte láidre uathchódaithe dí-chódaithe, le gnóthachan suas le 1.3 BLEU agus suas le 9.2 pointe cruinnis aonáin don aistriúchán Béarla-Rúisis.', 'el': 'Έχει αποδειχθεί ότι τα μοντέλα μηχανικής μετάφρασης συνήθως παράγουν κακές μεταφράσεις για ονομαστικές οντότητες που είναι σπάνια στο εκπαιδευτικό σώμα. Οι παλαιότερες μέθοδοι μετάφρασης οντοτήτων επικεντρώνονται κυρίως στη φωνητική μεταγραφή, η οποία αγνοεί το πλαίσιο της πρότασης για τη μετάφραση και περιορίζεται στην κάλυψη του τομέα και της γλώσσας. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτός ο περιορισμός, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο προεκπαίδευσης που χρησιμοποιεί μεγάλες ποσότητες μονογλωσσικών δεδομένων και μια βάση γνώσεων για τη βελτίωση της ακρίβειας της μετάφρασης ονομασμένων οντοτήτων μέσα σε προτάσεις. Εκτός αυτού, ερευνούμε μια στρατηγική εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών που συντονίζει ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο μοντέλο νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης τόσο σε μονογλωσσικά δεδομένα με ενισχυμένη οντότητα όσο και σε παράλληλα δεδομένα για περαιτέρω βελτίωση της μετάφρασης οντοτήτων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε τρία γλωσσικά ζεύγη δείχνουν ότι η βαθειά υποβάθμιση οδηγεί σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τις ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης αποκωδικοποίησης αυτόματης κωδικοποίησης, με κέρδος μέχρι 1.3 και μέχρι 9.2 σημείων ακρίβειας οντότητας για αγγλική-ρωσική μετάφραση.', 'hu': 'Kimutatták, hogy a gépi fordítási modellek általában rossz fordításokat generálnak a nevezett entitások számára, amelyek ritkán vannak a képzési korpuszban. A korábban megnevezett entitás fordítási módszerek elsősorban a fonetikus transzliterációra összpontosítanak, amely figyelmen kívül hagyja a fordításhoz szükséges mondatkörnyezetet, és korlátozott a tartomány és a nyelv lefedettsége. Ennek a korlátozásnak a kezelése érdekében a DEEP-t javasoljuk, egy DEEP-t, egy DEnoising Entity Pre-training módszert, amely nagy mennyiségű egynyelvű adatot és egy tudásbázist használ fel a mondatokon belüli megnevezett entitások fordítási pontosságának javítására. Emellett egy többfeladatos tanulási stratégiát vizsgálunk, amely egy előre képzett neurális gépi fordítási modellt finomhangolja mind az entitásbővített egynyelvű adatokon, mind a párhuzamos adatokon, hogy tovább javítsa az entitások fordítását. Három nyelvpáron végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a DEEP jelentős javulást eredményez az erőteljes automatikus kódolási alapvonalakhoz képest, ami akár 1,3 BLEU-s nyereséget és akár 9,2 entitási pontot is elér az angol-orosz fordításhoz.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენებულია, რომ მაქსინური გაგრძელების მოდელები უბრალოდ შექმნა ცოტა გაგრძელები სახელსახულებისთვის, რომლებიც სახელსახულებისთვის არსებობს სა ყველაზე სახელ ინტერტიკის გადაწყვეტილების მეტოვები უფრო ფონეტიკური ტრანსლიტაციაზე ფონეტიკური გადაწყვეტილება, რომელიც უნდა გადაწყვეტილების კონტექსტს ჩვენ DEEP-ს წინასწორებლად მონოლიგური მონაცემების დიდი რაოდენობები და მეცნიერების ბაზა, რომელიც წინასწორებული ინტერტიკის წინასწორებაში გავაკეთებთ. დამატებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ მრავალური მონაცემების სწავლების სტრატიგია, რომელიც განსხვავებული ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების მოდელეგის მონაცემების მონაცემების და პარალელური მონაცემების გა ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები სამი ენათა ზოგების შესახებ, რომ DEEP შეიძლება მნიშვნელოვანი უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომელიც ავტოკოდირება', 'it': "È stato dimostrato che i modelli di traduzione automatica di solito generano traduzioni inadeguate per entità nominate che sono rare nel corpus di formazione. I metodi di traduzione delle entità precedentemente denominati si concentrano principalmente sulla traslitterazione fonetica, che ignora il contesto della frase per la traduzione ed è limitata nella copertura del dominio e della lingua. Per ovviare a questa limitazione, proponiamo DEEP, un metodo di pre-formazione DEnoising Entity che sfrutta grandi quantità di dati monolingue e una base di conoscenze per migliorare l'accuratezza della traduzione delle entità nominate all'interno delle frasi. Inoltre, studiamo una strategia di apprendimento multi-task che perfeziona un modello di traduzione automatica neurale pre-addestrato sia su dati monolingue amplificati da entità che su dati paralleli per migliorare ulteriormente la traduzione delle entità. I risultati sperimentali su tre coppie linguistiche dimostrano che DEEP porta a miglioramenti significativi rispetto a forti linee di base di denoising auto-codifica, con un guadagno fino a 1,3 BLEU e fino a 9,2 punti di accuratezza entità per la traduzione inglese-russa.", 'lt': 'Buvo įrodyta, kad mašin ų vertimo modeliai paprastai sukuria prastus vertimus nurodytiems subjektams, kurie mokymo korpuse nedažnai. Earlier named entity translation methods mainly focus on phonetic transliteration, which ignores the sentence context for translation and is limited in domain and language coverage.  Siekiant išspręsti šį apribojimą, siūlome DEEP, DEnoising Entity Pre training method, kuris sutelkia didelę vienkalbių duomenų sumą ir žinių bazę, kad būtų pagerintas vardinio subjekto vertimo tikslumas sakiniuose. Be to, mes tiriame daugiafunkcinę mokymosi strategiją, kuria patobulinamas iš anksto parengtas nervinių mašinų vertimo modelis, grindžiamas tiek subjektu padidintais monokalbiniais duomenimis, tiek lygiagrečiais duomenimis, siekiant toliau gerinti subjekto vertimą. Eksperimentiniai trijų kalbų poros rezultatai rodo, kad dėl DEEP gerokai pagerėjo, palyginti su tvirtais automatinio kodavimo baziniais taškais, o vertimo anglų ir rusų kalbomis taškai padidėjo iki 1,3 BLEU ir iki 9,2 subjekto tikslumo.', 'kk': 'Машин аудару үлгілері кәдімгі аталған орындар үшін кейбір аудармаларды орындайды. Олар корпустағы оқыту үшін кейбір аудармаларды жасайды. Бірінші аталған нысандарды аудару әдістеріне негізінде фонетикалық аудару әдістеріне назар аударып, сөздердің контексті елемейді, доменде және тіл мәліметінде шектелген. Бұл шектеуді шектеу үшін DEEP дегенді таңдаймыз. Бұл үлкен бірнеше тілді деректерді және мәлімет негізін сөйлемелердің ішінде аталған нысандарды аудару дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін үлкен білім мәліметтер Осымен қатар, біз бірнеше тапсырманың оқыту стратегиясын зерттейміз. Бұл невралдық компьютердің аудару үшін бірнеше тілік деректерді және параллелі деректерді жақсы аудару үшін бірнеше тілік аудару үшін бірнеш Үш тіл екеуінің эксперименталдық нәтижелері DEEP автокодтау негізгі сызықтарды күшті жақсартып, 1,3 BLEU және 9,2 нысандар ағылшын-руссия аудармасының ағылшын тілінің дұрыс нәтижесіне дейін жақсартылығын', 'mk': 'Докажано е дека моделите за машински превод обично генерираат лоши преводи за именувани ентитети кои се ретки во обуката корпус. Претходните методи на превод на ентитети се фокусираат главно на фонетска транслитерација, која го игнорира контекстот на речениците за превод и е ограничена во покривањето на домените и јазиците. To address this limitation, we propose DEEP, a DEnoising Entity Pre-training method that leverages large amounts of monolingual data and a knowledge base to improve named entity translation accuracy within sentences.  Покрај тоа, истражуваме стратегија за учење на мултизадачи која го пофинира предобучениот модел на превод на невројални машини на монојазични податоци зголемени од ентитетите и паралелни податоци за понатамошно подобрување на преводот на ентитетите. Експерименталните резултати на три пара јазици покажуваат дека ДЕЕП резултира со значителни подобрувања во однос на силното одбивање на основните линии за автокодирање, со добивка до 1,3 БЛЕУ и до 9,2 точки на прецизност на ентитетот за англиско-руски превод', 'ms': 'Name Kaedah terjemahan entiti bernama sebelumnya terutama fokus pada transliterasi fonetik, yang mengabaikan konteks kalimat untuk terjemahan dan terhad dalam penyamaran domain dan bahasa. Untuk mengatasi keterangan ini, kami cadangkan DEEP, kaedah Pra-latihan Entiti DEnoising yang menggunakan jumlah besar data monobahasa dan pangkalan pengetahuan untuk meningkatkan ketepatan terjemahan entiti bernama dalam kalimat. Selain itu, kami menyelidiki strategi pembelajaran multi-tugas yang menyesuaikan model terjemahan mesin saraf terlatih awal pada kedua-dua data monobahasa ditambah oleh entiti dan data selari untuk meningkatkan lebih lanjut terjemahan entiti. Experimental results on three language pairs demonstrate that DEEP results in significant improvements over strong denoising auto-encoding baselines, with a gain of up to 1.3 BLEU and up to 9.2 entity accuracy points for English-Russian translation.', 'ml': 'ഇത് കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പേരിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പാഠങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അ @ info: whatsthis ഈ പരിധിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d DEEP, ഒരു ഡെഡിയോണിങ്ങ് എന്റിറ്റി പ്രെയിനിവിദ്യ-ട്രെയിനിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പല ജോലി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ക്രാജ്യം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു മുന്നില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോ Experimental results on three language pairs demonstrate that DEEP results in significant improvements over strong denoising auto-encoding baselines, with a gain of up to 1.3 BLEU and up to 9.2 entity accuracy points for English-Russian translation.', 'mt': 'Intwera li mudelli ta’ traduzzjoni bil-magni ġeneraw traduzzjonijiet fqira għal entitajiet imsemmija li mhumiex frekwenti fil-korp tat-taħriġ. Il-metodi tat-traduzzjoni tal-entitajiet imsemmija qabel jiffokaw prinċipalment fuq it-traslitterazzjoni fonetika, li tinjora l-kuntest tas-sentenza għat-traduzzjoni u hija limitata fil-kopertura tad-dominju u tal-lingwa. Biex nindirizzaw din il-limitazzjoni, nipproponu d-DEEP, metodu ta’ taħriġ ta’ qabel l-Entità DEnoising li jiġġenera ammonti kbar ta’ dejta monolingwi u bażi ta’ għarfien biex tittejjeb il-preċiżjoni tat-traduzzjoni tal-entità msemmija fi ħdan is-sentenzi. Barra minn hekk, ninvestigaw strateġija ta’ tagħlim b’diversi kompiti li timfina mudell ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali mħarreġ minn qabel kemm fuq dejta monolingwi miżjuda mill-entità kif ukoll dejta parallel a biex ittejjeb aktar it-traduzzjoni tal-entità. Riżultati esperimentali fuq tliet pari lingwistiċi juru li d-DEEP jirriżulta f’titjib sinifikanti fuq linji bażi ta’ awto-kodifikazzjoni b’denużjoni qawwija, bi qligħ sa 1.3 BLEU u sa 9.2 punti ta’ preċiżjoni tal-entità għat-traduzzjoni Ingliż-Russu.', 'pl': 'Wykazano, że modele tłumaczeń maszynowych generują zwykle słabe tłumaczenia dla nazwanych podmiotów, które są rzadko występujące w korpusie szkoleniowym. Wcześniej nazwane metody tłumaczenia jednostek koncentrują się głównie na transliteracji fonetycznej, która ignoruje kontekst zdań dla tłumaczenia i jest ograniczona w zakresie domeny i języka. Aby rozwiązać to ograniczenie, proponujemy metodę DEEP, która wykorzystuje duże ilości danych jednojęzycznych i bazę wiedzy w celu poprawy dokładności tłumaczenia nazwanych jednostek w zdaniach. Ponadto badamy wielozadaniową strategię uczenia się, która dopracowuje wstępnie przeszkolony neuronowy model tłumaczenia maszynowego zarówno na danych jednojęzycznych, jak i danych równoległych w celu dalszej poprawy tłumaczenia jednostki. Wyniki eksperymentalne na trzech parach językowych pokazują, że DEEP przyczynia się do znaczącej poprawy w stosunku do silnych linii autokodowania, przynoszących do 1.3 BLEU i do 9.2 punktów dokładności jednostek dla tłumaczenia angielsko-rosyjskiego.', 'mn': 'Машин хөрөнгө оруулах загварууд ихэвчлэн сургалтын корпус дээр нэрлэгдсэн загваруудын хувьд ядуу хөрөнгө оруулдаг. Эхлээд нэрлэгдсэн нэгж орчуулах арга нь фонетик орчуулах арга юм. Энэ нь орчуулахын тулд өгүүлбэрийг эсэргүүцдэг бөгөөд хэлний мэдээллээр хязгаарлагддаг. Энэ хязгаарлалтыг удирдахын тулд бид DEEP-г, DEnoising Entity Pre-Training Method гэх мэт санал болгож байна. Энэ нь нэг хэл өгөгдлийн том хэмжээг болон мэдлэг суурь өгүүллийн дотор нэрлэгдсэн нэг төрлийн орнуудын зөв тодорхойлолтыг сай Үүнээс гадна бид олон ажлын суралцах стратегийг судалж байна. Эдийн нэг хэл дээр нэмэгдсэн нэг хэл өгөгдлийг болон нэг төрлийн өгөгдлийг илүү сайжруулахын тулд суралцагдсан мэдрэлийн дасгал хөгжүүлэх мэдрэлийг дасгал сурал Гурван хэл хоёрын туршилтын үр дүнд DEEP нь автокодлох суурь шулуунуудыг автокодлох суурь шулуунуудын тулд маш чухал сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь 1.3 BLEU хүртэл, 9.2 төрөлхтний тодорхойлолтоор Англ', 'no': 'Det er vist at maskineoversettelsmodeller genererer vanlegvis fattige oversettelsar for namnet entiteter som er ofte i opplæringskorpusen. Førre metodar med omsetjing av entitet er hovudsakelig fokusert på fonetiske transliterasjon, som ignorerer setningskonteksten for omsetjing og er begrenset i domenet og språk. For å handtera denne grensesnittet, fører vi DEEP, ein DEnoising Entity-føreøvingsmetode som leverer stor mengdar monospråk-data og ein kunnskapsbase for å forbetra nådd entitetsomsetjing nøyaktig i setningar. I tillegg undersøker vi ein strategi for å lære fleire oppgåver som finner ein først trengt neuralmaskinsomsetjingsmodul på begge einingar-augt monospråk-data og parallelle data for å forbetra omsetjing av einingar. Eksperimentale resultat på tre språkparar viser at DEEP resulterer i signifikante forbedringar over sterke indikatorer for automatisk koding baselinjer, med høve til opp til 1,3 BLEU og opp til 9,2 entitetsrettighetspunkt for engelsk-russisk omsetjing.', 'ro': 'S-a demonstrat că modelele de traducere automată generează, de obicei, traduceri slabe pentru entitățile numite care sunt rar frecvente în corpul de formare. Metodele anterioare de traducere a entităților denumite se concentrează în principal pe transliterația fonetică, care ignoră contextul propoziției pentru traducere și este limitată în domeniu și acoperire lingvistică. Pentru a aborda această limită, propunem DEEP, o metodă de pregătire a entității DEnoising, care utilizează cantități mari de date monolingve și o bază de cunoștințe pentru a îmbunătăți acuratețea traducerii entităților denumite în cadrul propozițiilor. În plus, investigăm o strategie de învățare multi-sarcină care reglează un model de traducere automată neurală pre-instruit atât pe datele monolingve augmentate de entitate, cât și pe datele paralele pentru a îmbunătăți în continuare traducerea entităților. Rezultatele experimentale pe trei perechi de limbi demonstrează că DEEP rezultă îmbunătățiri semnificative față de liniile de referință puternice de denotare auto-codificare, cu un câștig de până la 1,3 BLEU și până la 9,2 puncte de acuratețe entități pentru traducerea engleză-rusă.', 'sr': 'Pokazano je da modeli prevoda mašine obično stvaraju loše prevode za imenovane entitate koje su rijetko u tržišnom korpusu. Ranije nazvane metode prevoda entiteta uglavnom se fokusiraju na fonetičku transliteraciju, koja ignorira kontekst rečenice za prevod i ograničava se u domenu i jezičkom pokrivanju. Za rješavanje ovog ograničenja predlažemo DEEP, metodu predobučenja DEnoising Entity koji utiče na velike količine monojezičkih podataka i bazu znanja kako bi poboljšali preciznost prevođenja entiteta u rečenicama. Osim toga, istražujemo strategiju za učenje višestrukih zadataka koja završava predobučeni model neuralnog prevoda na obje pojačane monojezičke podatke i paralelne podatke kako bi dalje poboljšali prevod entiteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri jezičke parove pokazuju da DEEP rezultira značajnim poboljšanjima nad jakim osnovnim linijama za autokodiranje, uz dobitak do 1,3 BLEU i do 9,2 tačka tačnosti entiteta za prevod engleskog i ruskog jezika.', 'sv': 'Det har visat sig att maskin철vers채ttningsmodeller vanligtvis genererar d책liga 철vers채ttningar f철r namngivna entiteter som 채r s채llsynta i utbildningskorpusen. Tidigare namngivna entitets철vers채ttningsmetoder fokuserar huvudsakligen p책 fonetisk transliteration, som ignorerar meningskontexten f철r 철vers채ttning och 채r begr채nsad i dom채n- och spr책kt채ckning. F철r att ta itu med denna begr채nsning f철resl책r vi DEEP, en DEnoising Entity Pre-training metod som utnyttjar stora m채ngder enspr책kiga data och en kunskapsbas f철r att f철rb채ttra 철vers채ttningen av namngivna entiteter i meningar. Dessutom unders철ker vi en multi-task inl채rningsstrategi som finjusterar en pre-utbildad neural maskin철vers채ttningsmodell p책 b책de entitetsf철rst채rkta enspr책kiga data och parallella data f철r att ytterligare f철rb채ttra entitets철vers채ttning. Experimentella resultat p책 tre spr책kpar visar att DEEP resulterar i betydande f철rb채ttringar j채mf철rt med starka denoising autokodning baslinjer, med en vinst p책 upp till 1,3 BLEU och upp till 9,2 entitetsnoggrannhetspo채ng f철r engelsk-rysk 철vers채ttning.', 'si': 'ඒක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙලා තියෙන්නේ මැෂින් වාර්ථාව මදුල් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම නම් කිරීම් කරුණාවට නම් ක මුලින් නම් අභිවාදය විධානය පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන විධානයක් ප්\u200dරධාන විධානයක් ප්\u200dරධාන විධාන මේ සීමාව සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපි DEEP විශ්වාස කරනවා, DEsound-ක්\u200dරීයාත්මක ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒකෙන් විශාල භාෂාවික දත්ත සහ ද ඒ වගේම, අපි ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජ ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය-රුසියානු වාර්තාව සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා කියලා භාෂා ජාති තුනක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිච', 'so': 'Waxaa la muujiyey in noocyada turjumaadda machine sida caadiga ah waxay generaan turjumyo miskiin ah oo lagu magacaabaa, kuwaas oo ku caadi ah iskuulka waxbarashada. Horay waxaa lagu magacaabay qaababka turjumaadda ee entity, sida ugu horeysa waxay ku kalsoonaadaan qoraalka telefonetka, kaas oo ka jeeda qoraalka turjumista, waxaana lagu xadgudbaa daboolka afka iyo luqada. Si aan u baaraandegiso xadhkan, waxaannu u soo jeedaynaa DEEP, qaab ka horumarinta waxbarashada, kaas oo soo bixiya macluumaad badan oo af luuqadeed ah iyo saldhig aqoonta si loo hagaajiyo saxda turjumaadda ee dhamaadka lagu magacaabay. Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa qoraal waxbarasho oo badan, kaas oo ku qoran qaab horay loo tababaray qoraalka tarjumista maskaxda neurada ah oo ku qoran labada macluumaad oo af ah oo la kordhiyey iyo macluumaad lambarka ah si loo sii kordhiyo tarjumaadka macluumaadka. Imtixaanka waxaa ka soo baxay saddex labo oo luuqad ah oo ay muujiyaan in DEEP wuxuu ka soo baxaa hagaajimo aad u weyn oo ka kordhaya qorshaha qoraalka qoriga ah oo xoogga badan, waxayna kordhisaa ilaa 1.3 BLEU iyo ilaa 9.2 goobaha saxda ee afka Ingiriis-Ruushka.', 'ur': 'اس کو دکھایا گیا ہے کہ ماشین ترجمہ موڈل معمولاً نام داروں کے لئے کمزور ترجمہ پیدا کرتا ہے جو ٹرینگ کورپوس میں غیر عام ہیں۔ پہلے انٹیٹی ترجمہ طریقے کے نام سے زیادہ فونیٹی ترجمہ پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے، جو ترجمہ کے لئے مجلس کا کنٹیکسٹ نادانی کرتا ہے اور ڈومین اور زبان کاورج میں محدود ہے. یہ محدودیت کے لئے ہم DEEP کو پیش آموزش کرنے کے لئے پیش آموزش کرنے والی اینتیٹی کی طرح پیش آموزش دیتے ہیں جو ایک زبان سے بہت سی اندازے ڈاٹے اور ایک علم بنسس کو کلمات کے اندر نامہ داری ترجمہ دقیقیقیت کے ساتھ بہتر کرتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک multi task learning strategy کی تحقیق کررہے ہیں جو ایک پیش آموزش نائرول ماشین کی ترجمہ موڈل کو ان دونوں چیزوں پر زیادہ بڑھایا گیا ایک تکلیف دانہ اور parallel data کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے. تین زبان جوڑوں پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ DEEP اپنے اسکوندیونڈ بنسٹ لینوں کے ذریعہ مضبوط زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے اور 1.3 بلیوس تک اور 9.2 واحد تک انگلیسی-روسی ترجمہ کے مطابق مضبوط پوینٹوں کے ذریعہ سے اضاف', 'ta': 'இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாற்று மாதிரிகள் வழக்கமாக ஏழை மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது பயிற்சி  Name இந்த வரம்பை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, நாம் DEEP, ஒரு DEnoising Entity Pre-training முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பெரிய மொழிமொழியான தகவல் மற்றும் அறிவு தளத்தை வாக்கியங்களி அதற்கும் மேலும், நாம் பல பணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் திட்டம் ஒரு முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றி மாதிரி பின்னெஸ் முடிக்கும் பொருள்- அதி மூன்று மொழி ஜோடிகள் மீது சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது DEEP தானே குறியீட்டு அடிப்படைகளில் மிகவும் மேம்படுத்தும், அது 1. 3 பிலியுக்கு மேல் 1. 2 பெருக்', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Bu chegarani tasavvur qilish uchun biz DEEP, ta'lim soʻzlarida juda katta munalik maʼlumot va ma'lumot bazasini bajarishi mumkin. Besides, we investigate a multi-task learning strategy that finetunes a pre-trained neural machine translation model on both entity-augmented monolingual data and parallel data to further improve entity translation.  Uch tillar ikki xil natijalarida EEP natijalarini ko'rsatadi, o'zgarishni avto- kodlash asosiy sonlariga katta yaxshi o'zgartiradi, 1. 3 BLEU va ingliz- Ruscha tarjima qilish uchun 9. 2 tizimga aniqlangan tizimga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Nó đã được cho thấy rằng các mô- đun dịch vụ máy thường tạo ra một bản dịch khó cho các thực thể tên gọi mà hiếm gặp trong tập đoàn huấn luyện. Cách dịch thuyết tên trước đó chủ yếu tập trung vào dịch chuyển ngữ điện thoại, nó bỏ qua ngữ cảnh của bản dịch và giới hạn trong lĩnh vực và ngôn ngữ. Để thực hiện giới hạn này, chúng tôi đề nghị DEO, một phương pháp tiền huấn luyện To àn thể đáng sợ, sử dụng một lượng lớn dữ liệu ngôn ngữ và một căn cứ kiến thức để nâng cao độ chính xác dịch đơn vị tên trong các câu. Bên cạnh đó, chúng tôi nghiên cứu một chiến lược học đa nhiệm vụ khéo léo một mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh đã được đào tạo trên cả các dữ liệu độc ngôn ngữ cộng thêm và dữ liệu song song để cải tiến thực thể dịch. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên ba cặp ngôn ngữ cho thấy rằng DEO có kết quả cải thiện đáng kể về những căn cứ có mã hoá tự động, với một tích tăng lên tới 1.3 tiếng bíp và lên tới 9.2 thực thể chính xác của dịch Anh-Nga.', 'hr': 'Pokazano je da modeli prevoda strojeva obično stvaraju loše prevode za imenovane entitate koje su rijetko u tržišnom korpusu. Ranije nazvane metode prevoda entiteta uglavnom se fokusiraju na fonetičku transliteraciju, što ignorira kontekst rečenice za prevod i ograničava se u domenu i jezičkom pokrivanju. Za rješavanje ovog ograničenja predlažemo DEEP, metodu predobučenja DEnoising Entity-a koja utječe na velike količine monojezičkih podataka i bazu znanja kako bi poboljšala preciznost prevoda imena entiteta u kaznama. Osim toga, istražujemo strategiju za učenje višestrukog zadatka koja finalizira predobučeni model prevoda neuronskih strojeva na obje pojačane monojezičke podatke i paralelne podatke kako bi dalje poboljšali prevod entiteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri jezičke parove pokazuju da DEEP rezultira značajnim poboljšanjima nad jakim osnovnim linijama za autokodiranje, uz dobitak do 1,3 BLEU-a i do 9,2 tačka to čnosti entiteta za prevod engleskog i ruskog jezika.', 'bg': 'Доказано е, че моделите на машинен превод обикновено генерират лоши преводи за имената на субекти, които са рядко срещани в обучителния корпус. По-ранните методи за превод на обекти се фокусират главно върху фонетичната транслитерация, която игнорира контекста на изречението за превод и е ограничена в областта и езиковото покритие. За да се справим с това ограничение, предлагаме метод за предварително обучение, който използва големи количества едноезични данни и база от знания за подобряване точността на превода на имената в изреченията. Освен това, ние изследваме стратегия за обучение с множество задачи, която финализира предварително обучен модел на невронен машинен превод както върху едноезични данни, така и паралелни данни, за да подобри допълнително превода на обекти. Експерименталните резултати на три езикови двойки показват, че води до значителни подобрения в сравнение със силно обозначаване на базовите линии за автоматично кодиране, с печалба от до 1,3 и до 9,2 точки за точност на единиците за англо-руски превод.', 'da': 'Det er blevet vist, at maskinoversættelsesmodeller normalt genererer dårlige oversættelser for navngivne enheder, der er sjældent i træningskorpus. Tidligere navngivne entitetsoversættelsesmetoder fokuserer primært på fonetisk translitteration, som ignorerer sætningens kontekst til oversættelse og er begrænset i domæne- og sprogdækning. For at løse denne begrænsning foreslår vi DEEP, en DEnoising Entity Pre-training metode, der udnytter store mængder ensprogede data og en vidensbase til at forbedre nøjagtigheden af navngivne entiteters oversættelse i sætninger. Desuden undersøger vi en multi-task læringsstrategi, der finjusterer en præ-trænet neural maskinoversættelsesmodel på både enhedsforstærkede ensprogede data og parallelle data for yderligere at forbedre enhedsoversættelse. Eksperimentelle resultater på tre sprogpar viser, at DEEP resulterer i betydelige forbedringer i forhold til stærke denoising auto-kodning baselines, med en gevinst på op til 1,3 BLEU og op til 9,2 enhedsnøjagtighedspunkter for engelsk-russisk oversættelse.', 'nl': 'Het is aangetoond dat machinevertaalmodellen meestal slechte vertalingen genereren voor benoemde entiteiten die zelden voorkomen in het trainingscorpus. Eerder genoemde entiteitsvertaalmethoden richten zich voornamelijk op fonetische transliteratie, die de zinscontext voor vertaling negeert en beperkt is in domein- en taaldekking. Om deze beperking aan te pakken, stellen we DEEP voor, een DEnoise Entity Pre-training methode die gebruik maakt van grote hoeveelheden eentalige gegevens en een kennisbank om de nauwkeurigheid van de vertaling van benadeelde entiteiten binnen zinnen te verbeteren. Daarnaast onderzoeken we een multi-task leerstrategie die een vooraf getraind neural machine translation model verfijnt op zowel entity-augmented monolingual data als parallelle data om entiteitsvertaling verder te verbeteren. Experimentele resultaten op drie taalparen tonen aan dat DEEP resulteert in significante verbeteringen ten opzichte van sterke autocoderende basislijnen, met een toename van maximaal 1.3 BLEU en tot 9.2 entiteitsnauwkeurigheidspunten voor Engels-Russische vertaling.', 'de': 'Es wurde gezeigt, dass maschinelle Übersetzungsmodelle in der Regel schlechte Übersetzungen für benannte Entitäten erzeugen, die im Trainingskorpus selten vorkommen. Früher benannte Entitätenübersetzungsmethoden konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf phonetische Transliteration, die den Satzkontext für die Übersetzung ignoriert und in Domänen- und Sprachabdeckung begrenzt ist. Um dieser Einschränkung entgegenzuwirken, schlagen wir DEEP vor, eine DEnoising Entity Pre-Training Methode, die große Mengen an einsprachigen Daten und eine Wissensbasis nutzt, um die Genauigkeit der Übersetzung benannter Entitäten innerhalb von Sätzen zu verbessern. Außerdem untersuchen wir eine Multi-Task-Lernstrategie, die ein vortrainiertes neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungsmodell sowohl auf entity-augmented einsprachigen Daten als auch auf parallelen Daten verfeinert, um die Entity-Translation weiter zu verbessern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an drei Sprachpaaren zeigen, dass DEEP zu signifikanten Verbesserungen gegenüber stark denoisierenden Autokodierungsbaselines führt, mit einem Gewinn von bis zu 1.3 BLEU und bis zu 9.2 Entitätsgenauigkeitspunkten für Englisch-Russisch Übersetzungen.', 'id': 'Ditunjukkan bahwa model terjemahan mesin biasanya menghasilkan terjemahan yang buruk untuk entitas bernama yang tidak sering dalam korpus latihan. Metode terjemahan entitas bernama sebelumnya terutama fokus pada transliterasi fonetik, yang mengabaikan konteks kalimat untuk terjemahan dan terbatas dalam domain dan lingkungan menutupi. Untuk mengatasi batasan ini, kami mengusulkan DEEP, sebuah metode DEnoising Entity Pre-training yang menggunakan jumlah besar data monobahasa dan sebuah dasar pengetahuan untuk meningkatkan akurasi terjemahan entitas bernama dalam kalimat. Selain itu, kami menyelidiki strategi pembelajaran multi-tugas yang memperbaiki model terjemahan mesin saraf yang dilatih sebelumnya pada kedua data monobahasa yang ditambah oleh entitas dan data paralel untuk memperbaiki lebih lanjut terjemahan entitas. Hasil eksperimen pada tiga pasangan bahasa menunjukkan bahwa DEEP menghasilkan peningkatan yang signifikan atas kuat menolak garis dasar pengekodan otomatis, dengan keuntungan sampai 1,3 BLEU dan sampai 9,2 titik akurasi entitas untuk terjemahan Inggris-Rusia.', 'sw': 'Imeonyeshwa kuwa mifano ya kutafsiri mashine mara nyingi huzalisha tafsiri masikini kwa ajili ya vifaa vinavyoitwa ambavyo vinatokea vikosi vya mafunzo. Kabla ya awali zilizotajwa na njia za tafsiri za entity hasa zinajikita kwenye usambazaji wa simu za mkononi, ambazo hupuuza muktadha wa sentensi kwa kutafsiri na imewekwa muhimu katika habari za ndani na lugha. Ili kukabiliana na vizuizi hiki, tunapendekeza DEEP, njia ya mafunzo ya Uandishi wa Utamaduni wa Utamaduni wa Utamaduni inayotumia idadi kubwa ya takwimu za lugha za kimonoliki na msingi wa maarifa ili kuboresha uhakika wa utafsiri wa entity ndani ya hukumu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachunguza mkakati wa kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi ambazo tunatengeneza mfano wa tafsiri ya mashine ya neura iliyoendelea kwa vyombo viwili vinavyoongezeka data za kiutamaduni na takwimu za usambazaji ili kuongeza tafsiri ya kiserikali. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa chama cha lugha tatu cha DEEP kinasababisha maendeleo makubwa zaidi ya mistari yenye uchunguzi wa kujiorodhesha, ikiwa na ongezeko la kufikia 1.3 BLEU na hadi points sahihi kwa ajili ya tafsiri ya Kiingereza na Urusi.', 'ko': '연구에 따르면 기계 번역 모델은 일반적으로 훈련 자료 라이브러리에서 흔히 볼 수 없는 명명 실체에 대해 나쁜 번역을 일으킨다고 한다.초기의 명명 실체 번역 방법은 주로 음성 음역에 중심을 두었고 번역된 문장의 언어 환경을 소홀히 하여 영역과 언어의 범위에서 제한을 받았다.이러한 한계를 해결하기 위해 우리는 DEEP, 대량의 단어 데이터와 지식 라이브러리를 이용하여 문장에서 명명된 실체의 번역 정밀도를 향상시키는 소음 제거 실체 예훈련 방법을 제시했다.그 밖에 우리는 다중 임무 학습 전략을 연구했다. 이 전략은 실체 강화 단어 데이터와 병행 데이터에서 미리 훈련된 신경 기계 번역 모델을 미세하게 조정하여 실체 번역을 더욱 개선했다.세 언어 대조에서의 실험 결과, 강한 소음 제거 자동 코딩 기준선에 비해 DEEP는 영어-러시아어 번역의 BLEU와 실체 정확도를 각각 1.3과 9.2로 현저히 높였다.', 'fa': 'نشان داده شده که مدلهای ترجمه ماشین معمولاً ترجمه های بدی برای شرکتهای نامیده که در شرکت آموزش غیرعادی هستند تولید می کنند. پیش از این روش\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی entity به عنوان عنوان فرهنگ اصلی روی ترجمه\u200cسازی فونیک تمرکز می\u200cکند، که محیط جمله\u200cی ترجمه را نادیده می\u200cگیرد و در حفاظت دومین و زبان محدود می\u200c برای حل این محدودیت، ما DEEP را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک روش پیش آموزش شرکت DEnoising Entity که تعداد زیادی از داده\u200cهای واحد زبان و پایگاه دانش را برای بهبود دادن دقیق ترجمه نامیده شده\u200cای در جمله\u200cها تحویل می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، ما استراتژی یادگیری چندین کار را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که یک مدل ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی پیش آموزش داده می\u200cشود بر هر دو داده\u200cهای متحد زبان و داده\u200cهای متحد برای تحقیق ترجمه\u200cهای متحد\u200cتر از متحد متحد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی سه جفت زبان نشان می\u200cدهند که DEEP توسعه\u200cهای زیادی بر روی خطوط\u200cهای زیرزمینی\u200cهای استواری که توسعه\u200cهای زیرزمینی\u200cهای ابتدایی\u200cکردن اتوکید می\u200cدهد، با سود تا ۱.۳ BLEU و تا ۹.۲ نقطه\u200cهای دقیقیت entity', 'af': "Dit is vertoon dat masjien vertaling modele gewoonlik arme vertalings genereer vir genaamde entiteite wat onvolledige is in die oefening corpus. Vroeër genaamde entiteitoersettingsmetodes fokus op fonetiese transliterasie, wat ignoreer die setkonteks vir vertaling en is beperk in domein en taal dekking. Om hierdie beperking te adres, voorstel ons DEEP, 'n besluistende Entiteit voor-onderwerking metode wat groot hoeveelheid van monolinglike data en 'n kennisbasie verhoog om genaamde entiteitse vertaling presisiteit binne-teikens te verbeter. Ons ondersoek ook 'n multi-taak leer strategie wat 'n voorafgevorderde neural masjien vertaling model op beide entiteite-vergroot monolinglike data en parallele data om entiteitse vertaling te verder verbeter. Eksperimentale resultate op drie taal paar vertoon dat DEEP resultaat in betekende verbeteringe oor sterk verduideling van outomatiese kodering basisline, met 'n verskaf tot 1,3 BLEU en tot 9,2 entiteit-presies punte vir Engels-Russiese vertaling.", 'tr': "Maşynyň terjime modelleri adatça adly zatlar üçin ýok terjime edendir. Edilmiş bir zat terjime metodlary görkezilişinde fonetik terjime etmek üçin fokus edýär. Bu sözler terjime etmek üçin däldir we domein we dil täblisasinde çykarylýar. Bu çykyş üçin DEEP'i gollaşdyrmak üçin, sözleriň içinde adlanan tek bir terjime dogrylygyny geliştirmek üçin gollaşdyran bir teklip berýäris. Munuň ýagdaýda, biz birnäçe işgär öwrenmek strategiýasyny çözdirip, hem birnäçe öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňünden öňden täsirli näöral maşynyň terjime modelini hem öňünden öňünden gelişmek üçin parallel Üç dil çiftinden örneşikli netijeler DEEP awtomatik ködleme çyzgytlaryny 1,3 BLEU we 9,2 sany diňe English-Rusça terjime etmek üçin has gowuraklygyny görkezýär.", 'sq': 'U tregua se modelet e përkthimit të makinave zakonisht gjenerojnë përkthime të dobëta për njësitë e emëruara që janë të paprekura në korpusin e trajnimit. Metodat e përkthimit të njësisë së quajtur më parë përqëndrohen kryesisht në transliteracionin fonetik, i cili injoron kontekstin e fjalëve për përkthimin dhe është i kufizuar në mbulimin e domenit dhe gjuhës. Për të trajtuar këtë kufizim, propozojmë DEEP, një metodë DEnoising Entity Pre-Training që nxjerr sasi të mëdha të të dhënave monogjuhësore dhe një bazë njohurie për të përmirësuar saktësinë e përkthimit të njësisë së quajtur brenda fjalëve. Përveç kësaj, ne hetojmë një strategji mësimi shumë-detyrash që përmirëson një model të paratrajnuar të përkthimit të makinave nervore në të dy të dhënat monogjuhësore të rritura nga njësia dhe të dhënat paralele për të përmirësuar më tej përkthimin e njësisë. Rezultatet eksperimentale në tre çifte gjuhësh demonstrojnë se DEEP rezulton në përmirësime të rëndësishme lidhur me shkatërrimin e fortë të linjave bazë të autokodimit, me një fitim deri në 1.3 BLEU dhe deri në 9.2 pikë të saktësisë të njësisë për përkthimin anglo-rusë.', 'hy': 'Պարզվել է, որ մեքենային թարգմանման մոդելները սովորաբար աղքատ թարգմանություններ են ստեղծում կոչված կազմակերպությունների համար, որոնք անհազվադեպ են ուսուցման կորպուսում: Առաջին անվանված էության թարգմանման մեթոդները հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են ֆոնետիկ տրանսգրականության վրա, որը անտեսում է թարգմանման նախադասությունների կոնտեքստը և սահմանափակվում է բնագավառի և լեզվի ծավա Այս սահմանափակումների լուծման համար մենք առաջարկում ենք DEAP-ը, DENoise ENT-ի նախապատրաստման մեթոդը, որը օգտագործում է մեծ քանակությամբ միալեզվով տվյալներ և գիտելիքների հիմք, որպեսզի բարելավվի անվանելի անհատականության թարգմանման ճ Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմահատվածային ուսումնասիրության ռազմավարություն, որը կատարում է նախապատրաստված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելը միալեզվով տվյալների և զուգահեռ տվյալների վրա, որպեսզի ավելի լավ կատարենք էության Երեք լեզվի զույգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ DEAP-ը նշանակալի բարելավումներ է բերում անգլերեն-ռուսերեն թարգմանման հզոր կոդավորման հիմնական գծերի նկատմամբ, որի շահույթը հասնում է մինչև 1.3 բլեուզ և մինչև 9.2 միավորի', 'am': 'It has been shown that machine translation models usually generate poor translations for named entities that are infrequent in the training corpus.  ምርጫዎች ይህንን ግንኙነት ለመግለጽ፣ DEEP፣ የDEnoising Entity Pre-Training method፣ ብዙ ብዛት የሞሎልቋል ዳታዎችን እና እውቀት መቀመጫን በተባለው አካባቢ ትርጉም እርግጠኛ እውቀት ማድረግ እንዲያሳድግ እና እውቀትን መቀመጫን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በብዙ-ስራ ትምህርት ተማሪ strategy፣ ለጥያቄው የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም ሞዴል በሁለቱም አካባቢው የሞሎልጋዊ ዳታ እና አካባቢውን ትርጉም ለመጨመር የሚችል ዳታዎችን እና አካላዊ ዳታዎችን ለመጠቀም እና ማስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሦስት ቋንቋዎች ሁለቶች ላይ የተፈተና ፍጻሜ DEEP በአምላካዊ ድምፅ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና እስከ 1.3 BLEU እና እስከ 9.2 አካላዊ እርግጠኛ ስርዓት በንግግሊዝና-ሮሽኛ ትርጓሜ ላይ የሚያደርግ ጥሩ ክፍተቶችን ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'এটি দেখা যাচ্ছে যে মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল সাধারণত নামের বিষয়বস্তুর জন্য দারিদ্র অনুবাদ তৈরি করে যা প্রশিক্ষণ কর্পুসে প্ প্রথমে নামের বস্তুর অনুবাদের পদ্ধতি মূলত ফোনেটিক ট্রান্সলিটারেশনের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে, যা অনুবাদের জন্য বাক্যের প্রেক্ষাপট উপ এই সীমাবদ্ধতা নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা DEEP প্রস্তাব করছি, একটি ডিওনিং এন্টিটি প্রেক্ষাপট পদ্ধতি, যা বিশাল পরিমাণ মোনোলিভাল ভাষায় তথ্য এবং একটি জ্ঞানের ব এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি বহুকাজের শিক্ষা কৌশল তদন্ত করি যা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেলের মাধ্যমে প্রশিক্ষিত একটি নিউরাল ভাষায় অনুবাদের মাধ্যম Experimental results on three language pairs demonstrate that DEEP results in significant improvements over strong denoising auto-encoding baselines, with a gain of up to 1.3 BLEU and up to 9.2 entity accuracy points for English-Russian translation.', 'bs': 'Pokazano je da modeli prevoda mašine obično stvaraju loše prevode za imenovane entitate koje su rijetko u tržišnom korpusu. Ranije nazvane metode prevoda entiteta uglavnom se fokusiraju na fonetičku transliteraciju, koja ignorira kontekst rečenice za prevod i ograničava se u domenu i jezičkom pokrivanju. Da bi se riješili ta ograničenja, predlažemo DEEP, metodu predobučenja DEnoising Entity koji utiče na velike količine monojezičkih podataka i bazu znanja kako bi poboljšali preciznost prevođenja entiteta u okviru kazne. Osim toga, istražujemo strategiju za učenje višestrukog zadatka koja finalizira predobučeni model neuronskog prevoda na obje pojačane monojezičke podatke i paralelne podatke kako bi dalje poboljšali prevod entiteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati na tri jezičke parove pokazuju da DEEP rezultira značajnim poboljšanjima nad jakim osnovnim linijama za autokodiranje, uz dobitak do 1,3 BLEU-a i do 9,2 tačka to čnosti entiteta za prevod engleskog i ruskog jezika.', 'az': "Makina çevirim modellərinin çox sıxıntılı təhsil korpusında adlı təhsil işləri üçün zəif tercümələr yaratdığını göstərildi. Əvvəllər təkrarlama təkrarlama metodlarını fonetik təkrarlama üstündə təsirləndirir. Bu cümlələr təkrarlama məlumatını görməz və domeində və dil örtüklərində sınır edilir. Bu hədləri çəkmək üçün DEEP'i təklif edirik, sözlərin içində böyük dəyişiklik məlumatlarını və elm bazını təklif edir. Daha çox işin öyrənməsi stratejisini araşdırdıq ki, hər ikisinin birlikdə artırılmış monodil verilər və paralel verilər üçün daha çox təhsil edilmiş nöral maşına çevirilməsi modelini daha yaxşı təhsil edir. Üç dil çiftlərinin təcrübəsi sonuçları DEEP'in öz-kodlama əsas çətinlərini göstərmək üçün möhkəm uzlaşdırmağını göstərir, 1,3 BLEU və İngilizə-Rusya tercüməsi üçün 9,2 ünvanların doğruluğu nöqtələri ilə istifadə edir.", 'ca': "S'ha demostrat que els models de traducció màquina generalment generen males traduccions per entitats anomenades que són poc freqüents al cos d'entrenament. Els mètodes de traducció d'entitats anomenats anteriorment es centren principalment en la transliteració fonètica, que ignora el context de frases per a la traducció i està limitat en la cobertura de dominis i llenguatge. Per abordar aquesta limitació, proposem DEEP, un mètode de pré-capacitació de l'entitat DEnoising que aprofita grans quantitats de dades monolingües i una base de coneixements per millorar la precisió de traducció de l'entitat anomenada dins les frases. A més, investigam una estratègia d'aprenentatge multitasca que millora un model de traducció neuromàtica pré-entrenat en dades monollengües augmentates per entitats i dades paralleles per millorar més la traducció d'entitats. Els resultats experimentals en tres parells de llengües demostren que el DEEP resulta en millores significatives en comparació amb la forta denuncia de les línies de base de codificació automàtica, amb un guany fins a 1,3 BLEU i fins a 9,2 punts de precisió de l'entitat per la traducció anglès-rusa.", 'cs': 'Bylo prokázáno, že modely strojového překladu obvykle generují špatné překlady pro pojmenované entity, které jsou v školicím korpusu zřídka. Dřívější metody překladu entit se zaměřují především na fonetickou transliteraci, která ignoruje kontext věty pro překlad a je omezena v oblasti domény a jazykového pokrytí. Pro řešení tohoto omezení navrhujeme metodu DEEP, která využívá velké množství monojazyčných dat a znalostní bázi pro zlepšení přesnosti překladu jmenovaných entit ve větách. Kromě toho zkoumáme strategii víceúlohového učení, která jemně ladí předem trénovaný neuronový strojový překlad na jednojjazyčných datech rozšířených entitou i paralelních datech, abychom další zlepšili překlad entit. Experimentální výsledky na třech jazykových párech ukazují, že DEEP vede k výraznému zlepšení oproti silným denoisačním autokódování základních linek, se zvýšením až 1.3 BLEU a až 9.2 body přesnosti entit pro anglicko-ruský překlad.', 'et': 'On näidatud, et masintõlke mudelid tekitavad tavaliselt halbu tõlkeid nimetatud üksustele, mida koolituskorpuses harva esineb. Varasemad nimetatud olemitõlkemeetodid keskenduvad peamiselt foneetilisele transliteratsioonile, mis ignoreerib lausekonteksti tõlkimisel ning on piiratud domeeni ja keele katvuse poolest. Selle piirangu lahendamiseks pakume välja DEEP, DEnoising Entity Pre-training meetodi, mis kasutab suurt hulka ühekeelseid andmeid ja teadmistebaasi, et parandada nimetatud olemi tõlke täpsust lausetes. Lisaks uurime mitme ülesandega õppestrateegiat, mis täpsustab eelnevalt väljaõpetatud neuraalse masintõlke mudelit nii olemi laiendatud ühekeelsetel andmetel kui ka paralleelsetel andmetel, et täiustada olemi tõlkimist. Kolme keelepaari eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et DEEP-i tulemuseks on märkimisväärne paranemine võrreldes tugeva denoiseerimise automaatse kodeerimise lähtejoonega, suurenedes kuni 1,3 BLEU ja kuni 9,2 olemi täpsuspunkti inglise-vene tõlke puhul.', 'fi': 'On osoitettu, ett채 konek채채nn철smallit tuottavat yleens채 huonoja k채채nn철ksi채 nimetyille kokonaisuuksille, jotka ovat harvoin koulutuskorpusessa. Aiemmin nimetyt entiteettik채채nn철smenetelm채t keskittyv채t p채채asiassa foneettiseen transliteraatioon, joka sivuuttaa k채채nn철ksen lausekontekstin ja on rajoitettu toimialueeltaan ja kielelt채채n. T채m채n rajoituksen korjaamiseksi ehdotamme DEEP:t채, DEnoising Entity Pre-training -menetelm채채, joka hy철dynt채채 suuria m채채ri채 monikielist채 tietoa ja tietopohjaa parantaakseen nimettyjen entiteettien k채채nn철sten tarkkuutta lauseissa. Lis채ksi tutkimme moniteht채v채oppimisstrategiaa, joka hienos채채t채채 ennalta koulutetun neurokonek채채nn철smallin sek채 entiteettilis채ttyyn monikieliseen dataan ett채 rinnakkaisdataan parantaakseen entiteettik채채nn철st채 entisest채채n. Kokeelliset tulokset kolmella kieliparilla osoittavat, ett채 DEEP tuottaa merkitt채vi채 parannuksia voimakkaaseen denoisoivaan automaattiseen koodaukseen verrattuna, ja vahvistus on jopa 1,3 BLEU ja jopa 9,2 entiteetin tarkkuuspistett채 englannin-ven채j채n k채채nn철ksess채.', 'sk': 'Pokazano je bilo, da modeli strojnega prevajanja običajno ustvarjajo slabe prevode za imenovane subjekte, ki so redki v korpusu usposabljanja. Prevajalske metode prej imenovanih entitet se osredotočajo predvsem na fonetično transliteracijo, ki prezre kontekst stavka za prevod in je omejena v domeni in jezikovni pokritosti. Za obravnavo te omejitve predlagamo DEEP, metodo predusposabljanja DEnoising Entity, ki uporablja velike količine enojezičnih podatkov in bazo znanja za izboljšanje natančnosti prevajanja imenovanih entitet v stavkih. Poleg tega raziskujemo strategijo večopravilnega učenja, ki izpopolnjuje vnaprej usposobljen model nevronskega strojnega prevajanja na enojezičnih podatkih, povečanih z entitetami, in vzporednih podatkih za nadaljnje izboljšanje prevajanja entitet. Eksperimentalni rezultati treh jezikovnih parov kažejo, da ima DEEP pomembne izboljšave v primerjavi z izhodiščnimi črtami močnega označevanja samokodiranja, z dobičkom do 1,3 BLEU in do 9,2 točke natančnosti entitete za angleško-ruski prevod.', 'ha': "An nuna shi cewa misãlai masu fassarar mashine ko da yaushe, suna ƙiƙiro fassarori matalauci wa abubuwa da aka suna abubuwa masu yin abubuwa a cikin umarnin. @ info: whatsthis Domin da za'a yi amfani da wannan tsarin, za'a buƙata DAEP, wata shiryarwa na Kwamfyuta ta Pre-Training, wanda ke ƙara yawan data na monoliki da kuma wani bango na ilmi dõmin ya gyãra tsarin fassarar abun da aka suna fassarar cikin kwanan haske. Bayan haka, muna ƙidãya wani akadi na sanar da mulki-aikin da za'a samar da shirin fassarar maɓallin neural a gaba-wa-zaman-tunkuɗe, kan duk abun-augmentated data na monoli da data masu parallel dõmin ka ƙara kyautata fassarar abun. Matarin da aka jarraba nau'i uku cikin harshen suka nuna cewa DAEP na ƙara marubuci mai girma wa kwanza-kodkodin-farat, da wani amfani da up to 1.3 BLEU kuma up to 9.2 shaidar sahihi point for translation-Ruushi.", 'he': 'הוראה שדוגמני תרגום מכונות בדרך כלל יוצרים תרגומות גרועות לאנשים בשם שלא נדירות בקורפוס האימונים. שיטות התרגום של ישות בשם קודם יותר מתמקדות בעיקר בטרנסליטציה פונטית, אשר מתעלם מהקשר המשפטי לתרגום והוא מוגבל בתחום וכיסוי שפה. כדי להתמודד עם ההגבלה הזו, אנו מציעים DEEP, שיטת היחידות ההתאימות הקדמית DENoising שיוציאה כמויות גדולות של נתונים מונושפתיים ובסיס ידע לשפר את מדויקת התרגום היחידות בשם בתוך משפטים. Besides, we investigate a multi-task learning strategy that finetunes a pre-trained neural machine translation model on both entity-augmented monolingual data and parallel data to further improve entity translation.  תוצאות ניסיוניות על שלושה זוגות שפות מראות כי DEEP תוצאה בשיפורים משמעותיים על קווי הבסיס של קידום אוטומטי חזקים, עם רווח עד 1.3 BLEU ועד 9.2 נקודות מדויקות יחידות לתרגום אנגלי-רוסי.', 'jv': 'Rasane wis dipontrolan ngono model itolehasun Label Rasané punika ingkang dié limitiné, kita nggunakake DEOP, DEsound Entité Rasané Pangawe barang nggawe barang pengguna kuwi tindakan akeh barang kotang nggawe datayang dipunanggé lan sabanjuré awak dhéwé nggawe aturan prelimurasi kuwi cah-awak dhéwé. Nyong-ayo gambar, kita yatêngguna multi-task öyenne sistem sing dibutuhi nggambar sistem anyar sampeyan karo pentar nggambar sistem pentar nggambar sistem sing bisa nguasai sistem sing nyengkuyung nggambar sistem omongkuyung Pamid sing perusahaan karo telu nglanga kuwi sawetara DEep iso nglanggar bantuan luwih dumadhi supoyo nggawe ngubah sing automatically-koder, nganggo perusaha tanggal 1.3 B luwih sing dumadhi tanggal 9.2 sampeyan ingles -Rusa', 'bo': 'འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡིན་པས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མིང་དང་མིང་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་དབ Earlier named entity translation methods mainly focus on phonetic transliteration, which ignores the sentence context for translation and is limited in domain and language coverage. འུ་ཅག་གི་ཚད་འདི་ལྟར་ཞིབ་ཚད་འདིའི་དོན་ལྟར་DEEP(DEnoising Entity)ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་འབྲི་བ་དང་ཤེས་པའི་གཞ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་དཔྱད་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་ལག་གླིང་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྐད་ཡིག'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'كشف السخرية متعدد الوسائط عبر الشبكة التلافيفية للرسم البياني متعدد الوسائط', 'fr': 'Détection multimodale des sarcasmes via un réseau convolutif de graphes intermodaux', 'es': 'Detección de sarcasmo multimodal a través de una red convolucional de gráficos intermodales', 'pt': 'Detecção de sarcasmo multimodal via rede convolucional de gráfico multimodal', 'ja': 'クロスモーダルグラフ畳み込みネットワークを介したマルチモーダル皮肉検出', 'zh': '跨模态图卷积网络多模态刺检', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-मोडल ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क के माध्यम से मल्टी-मोडल व्यंग्य का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение многомодального сарказма через межмодальный граф сверточной сети', 'ga': 'Brath Sarcasm Ilmhódúil trí Líonra Comhtháite Graf Trasmhódúil', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση πολυ-Modal σαρκασμού μέσω διασταυρούμενου συνδυαστικού δικτύου γραφήματος', 'ka': 'Multi- Modal Sarcasm- ის განახლება Cross- Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'hu': 'Többmodális szarkazmus detektálás keresztmodális grafikon konvolúciós hálózaton keresztül', 'it': 'Rilevazione di sarcasmo multimodale tramite rete conveluzionale di grafici cross-modali', 'kk': 'Көптеген модельді саркасстың анықтауы көптеген графикалық құрылғылық желі арқылы', 'mk': 'Детектирање на мултимодниот сарказам преку крстомодна графска конволуционална мрежа', 'lt': 'Daugiamodulis sarkazmo aptikimas per tarpmodulį grafiko konvoliucinį tinklą', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Sarkasma Berberbilang-Modal melalui Rangkaian Berkonvolusi Graf Salib-Modal', 'mn': 'Олон-модал саркассмын олон олон мэдрэмж олох', 'mt': 'Sejbien ta’ Sarkazmu MultiModali permezz ta’ Netwerk ta’ Konvenzjoni ta’ Grafika Cross-Modali', 'no': 'Multimodal sarkasm- oppdaging via Cross- Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie wielomodalnego sarkazmu za pomocą sieci zwojowej wykresu crossmodalnego', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- മോഡല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കിലൂടെ ഒരുപാട് മോഡല്\u200d സര്\u200dക്കാസം ഡിറ്ററിഷന്\u200d', 'ro': 'Detectarea sarcasmului multimodal prin intermediul rețelei convoluționale cross-modale a graficului', 'sr': 'Multimodalna detekcija sarkasma putem konvolucionalne mreže krstomodalne grafike', 'so': 'Shabakadda saqafka iskuulka', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් සාර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න, ක්\u200dරොස්- මෝඩාල් ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය ජාල', 'ta': 'பல- மாற்று சார்காஸ் கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'sv': 'Multi-Modal Sarkasm Detection via Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'ur': 'Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện tử âm tim nhiều cách di động qua mạng lưới hình ảnh', 'da': 'Multi-Modal Sarkasm Detection via Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'hr': 'Multimodalna detekcija sarkasma putem konvolucionalne mreže Cross-Modal Graph', 'nl': 'Multi-Modal Sarcasme Detectie via Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'bg': 'Многомодално откриване на сарказъм чрез кръстосана графика конвелуционална мрежа', 'id': 'Multi-Modal Sarcasm Detection via Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'ko': '교차 모드 볼륨 네트워크 기반의 다중 모드 풍자 검출', 'fa': 'کشف سارکاسم چندModal Sarcasm via Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'de': 'Multi-Modal Sarkasmus Erkennung über Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'tr': 'Çoklu-Modal Sarkasm Etkinleşimi Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Sarcasm wa Vyombo vya Modal kupitia Mtandao wa Uchaguzi wa Vyombo vya Cross-Modal', 'af': 'Multi- Modaal Sarkasm Opdekking deur Cross- Modal Graaf Konvolusionele Netwerk', 'sq': 'Detektimi i Sarkazmit Multi-Modal nëpërmjet Rrjetit Ndërkombëtar Grafik', 'az': '√áoxlu Modal Sarkasm KeŇüfeti √á…ôrz-Modal Grafik Konvolucional Ańü vasit…ôsil…ô', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Բազմամոդալ սարկազմի հայտնաբերումը խաչմոդալ գրաֆի հակառակցման ցանցի միջոցով', 'bn': 'ক্রস-মডেল গ্রাফ কনভোলোশনেশন নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে বহুবার মোডেল সার্কাস্ম তথ্য', 'bs': 'Multimodalna detekcija sarkasma putem konvolucionalne mreže Cross-Modal Graph', 'ca': 'Detecció multimòdica del sarcasme a través de la xarxa de conversió de gràfics transmòdics', 'cs': 'Detekce multimodálního sarkasmu pomocí křížové grafové konveluční sítě', 'et': 'Mitmemodaalne sarkasmi tuvastamine transmodaalse graafiku konvolutsioonivõrgu kaudu', 'fi': 'Monimodaalinen sarkasmin tunnistus Cross-Modal Graph konvolutional Network', 'jv': 'Multi-modal Sarkasm detection by Kr-modal Graph convolution Network', 'sk': 'Večmodalno zaznavanje sarkazma prek konvolucijskega omrežja Cross-Modal Graph', 'ha': 'Multi-Modal Sarcasm Detection via Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network', 'he': 'גילוי סרקזם רב-מודיאלי באמצעות רשת שינוי גרף צלב-מודיאלית', 'bo': 'Multi-Modal Sarcasm Detection via Cross-Modal Graph Convolutional Network'}
{'en': 'Transformer architectures have achieved state- of-the-art results on a variety of natural language processing (NLP) tasks. However, their attention mechanism comes with a quadratic complexity in sequence lengths, making the computational overhead prohibitive, especially for long sequences. Attention context can be seen as a random-access memory with each token taking a slot. Under this perspective, the memory size grows linearly with the sequence length, and so does the overhead of reading from it. One way to improve the efficiency is to bound the memory size. We show that disparate approaches can be subsumed into one abstraction, attention with bounded-memory control (ABC), and they vary in their organization of the memory. ABC reveals new, unexplored possibilities. First, it connects several efficient attention variants that would otherwise seem apart. Second, this abstraction gives new insights—an established approach (Wang et al., 2020b) previously thought to not be applicable in causal attention, actually is. Last, we present a new instance of ABC, which draws inspiration from existing ABC approaches, but replaces their heuristic memory-organizing functions with a learned, contextualized one. Our experiments on language modeling, machine translation, and masked language model finetuning show that our approach outperforms previous efficient attention models; compared to the strong transformer baselines, it significantly improves the inference time and space efficiency with no or negligible accuracy loss.', 'ar': 'مع تزايد شعبية نشر الرسائل متعددة الوسائط عبر الإنترنت ، تم إجراء العديد من الدراسات الحديثة باستخدام المعلومات النصية والمرئية لاكتشاف السخرية متعددة الوسائط. في هذه الورقة ، نحقق في اكتشاف السخرية متعددة الوسائط من منظور جديد من خلال إنشاء رسم بياني متعدد الوسائط لكل حالة لرسم العلاقات الساخرة بشكل صريح بين الطرائق النصية والبصرية. على وجه التحديد ، نكتشف أولاً الكائنات المقترنة بأوصاف طريقة الصورة ، مما يتيح تعلم المعلومات المرئية المهمة. بعد ذلك ، يتم تقديم أوصاف الكائنات كجسر لتحديد أهمية الارتباط بين كائنات طريقة الصورة والكلمات السياقية لطريقة النص ، وذلك لإنشاء رسم بياني متعدد الوسائط لكل مثيل متعدد الوسائط. علاوة على ذلك ، فإننا نبتكر شبكة تلافيفية للرسم البياني متعدد الوسائط لفهم علاقات التناقض بين طرائق الكشف عن السخرية متعددة الوسائط. تظهر النتائج التجريبية الشاملة والتحليل المتعمق أن نموذجنا يحقق أداءً متطورًا في اكتشاف السخرية متعددة الوسائط.', 'fr': "Avec la popularité croissante de la publication de messages multimodaux en ligne, de nombreuses études récentes ont été réalisées en utilisant à la fois des informations textuelles et visuelles pour la détection multimodale des sarcasmes. Dans cet article, nous étudions la détection multimodale du sarcasme d'un point de vue novateur en construisant un graphique intermodal pour chaque instance afin de dessiner explicitement les relations ironiques entre les modalités textuelles et visuelles. Plus précisément, nous détectons d'abord les objets associés à des descriptions de la modalité d'image, ce qui permet d'apprendre des informations visuelles importantes. Ensuite, les descriptions des objets servent de pont pour déterminer l'importance de l'association entre les objets de modalité d'image et les mots contextuels de modalité de texte, de manière à construire un graphe intermodal pour chaque instance multimodale. En outre, nous concevons un réseau convolutif de graphes intermodaux pour comprendre les relations d'incongruité entre les modalités de détection multimodale des sarcasmes. Des résultats expérimentaux approfondis et des analyses approfondies montrent que notre modèle atteint des performances de pointe en matière de détection multimodale des sarcasmes.", 'pt': 'Com a crescente popularidade da postagem de mensagens multimodais online, muitos estudos recentes foram realizados utilizando informações textuais e visuais para detecção de sarcasmo multimodal. Neste artigo, investigamos a detecção de sarcasmo multimodal a partir de uma nova perspectiva, construindo um gráfico cross-modal para cada instância para desenhar explicitamente as relações irônicas entre as modalidades textuais e visuais. Especificamente, primeiro detectamos os objetos emparelhados com descrições da modalidade de imagem, permitindo o aprendizado de informações visuais importantes. Em seguida, as descrições dos objetos servem como ponte para determinar a importância da associação entre os objetos da modalidade imagem e as palavras contextuais da modalidade texto, de modo a construir um grafo cross-modal para cada instância multimodal. Além disso, desenvolvemos uma rede convolucional de grafos multimodais para dar sentido às relações de incongruência entre modalidades para detecção de sarcasmo multimodal. Extensos resultados experimentais e análises aprofundadas mostram que nosso modelo alcança desempenho de última geração na detecção multimodal de sarcasmo.', 'es': 'Con la creciente popularidad de publicar mensajes multimodales en línea, muchos estudios recientes se han llevado a cabo utilizando información textual y visual para la detección multimodal del sarcasmo. En este artículo, investigamos la detección multimodal del sarcasmo desde una perspectiva novedosa mediante la construcción de un gráfico intermodal para cada instancia para trazar explícitamente las relaciones irónicas entre las modalidades textual y visual. Específicamente, primero detectamos los objetos junto con las descripciones de la modalidad de imagen, lo que permite el aprendizaje de información visual importante. Luego, las descripciones de los objetos sirven de puente para determinar la importancia de la asociación entre los objetos de la modalidad de imagen y las palabras contextuales de la modalidad de texto, a fin de construir un gráfico intermodal para cada instancia multimodal. Además, diseñamos una red convolucional de gráficos intermodales para dar sentido a las relaciones de incongruencia entre las modalidades de detección multimodal de sarcasmo. Los exhaustivos resultados experimentales y el análisis en profundidad muestran que nuestro modelo logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en la detección de sarcasmo multimodal.', 'ja': 'オンラインでのマルチモーダルメッセージの投稿の人気が高まるにつれて、マルチモーダル皮肉検出のためにテキスト情報と視覚情報の両方を利用する多くの最近の研究が行われている。 本稿では、テキストと視覚の関係を明示的に描くために、各事例のクロスモーダルグラフを構築することにより、新規の観点からマルチモーダル皮肉検出を検討する。 具体的には、まず画像モダリティの記述と対になるオブジェクトを検出し、重要な視覚情報の学習を可能にする。 次いで、マルチモーダルインスタンスごとにクロスモーダルグラフを構築するために、オブジェクトの説明は、画像モーダリティのオブジェクトとテキストモーダリティのコンテキストワードとの間の関連付けの重要性を決定するためのブリッジとして機能する。 さらに、マルチモーダル皮肉検出の様式間の不整合関係を理解するために、クロスモーダルグラフ畳み込みネットワークを考案する。 広範な実験結果と詳細な分析により、当社のモデルは、マルチモーダル皮肉検出における最先端のパフォーマンスを達成していることが示されています。', 'zh': '随在线多模消息日普,近多用文本及视息多模刺检。 于本文中,每事构一跨模态图来于新颖多模态刺检,以明画本视模态之刺。 具体来说,先检与图像模态述配对所在,以学重视。 然后述所述为桥梁,定模态所模态,上下文词之要,以为每多模态例为跨模态图。 设跨模态图卷积网络,以解多模态刺检模态不一致性关系。 博实验深分析表明,模态刺最先进。', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल संदेशों को ऑनलाइन पोस्ट करने की बढ़ती लोकप्रियता के साथ, कई हालिया अध्ययनों को बहु-मोडल व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए पाठ्य और दृश्य जानकारी दोनों का उपयोग करके किया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम प्रत्येक उदाहरण के लिए एक क्रॉस-मोडल ग्राफ का निर्माण करके एक उपन्यास परिप्रेक्ष्य से बहु-मोडल व्यंग्य का पता लगाने की जांच करते हैं ताकि स्पष्ट रूप से पाठ्य और दृश्य तौर-तरीकों के बीच विडंबनापूर्ण संबंधों को आकर्षित किया जा सके। विशेष रूप से, हम पहले छवि रूपरेखा के विवरण के साथ जोड़ी गई वस्तुओं का पता लगाते हैं, जिससे महत्वपूर्ण दृश्य जानकारी सीखने में सक्षम होता है। फिर, वस्तुओं के विवरण को छवि रूपरेखा की वस्तुओं और पाठ पद्धति के प्रासंगिक शब्दों के बीच संबंध के महत्व को निर्धारित करने के लिए एक पुल के रूप में परोसा जाता है, ताकि प्रत्येक बहु-मोडल उदाहरण के लिए एक क्रॉस-मोडल ग्राफ का निर्माण किया जा सके। इसके अलावा, हम बहु-मोडल व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए तौर-तरीकों के बीच असंगतता संबंधों को समझने के लिए एक क्रॉस-मोडल ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क तैयार करते हैं। व्यापक प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम और गहराई से विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल बहु-मोडल व्यंग्य का पता लगाने में अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'С ростом популярности размещения мультимодальных сообщений в Интернете было проведено много недавних исследований с использованием как текстовой, так и визуальной информации для обнаружения мультимодального сарказма. В этой статье мы исследуем мультимодальное обнаружение сарказма с новой точки зрения, создавая кросс-модальный график для каждого экземпляра, чтобы явно нарисовать иронические отношения между текстовыми и визуальными модальностями. В частности, мы сначала обнаруживаем объекты в паре с описаниями модальности изображения, что позволяет изучать важную визуальную информацию. Затем описания объектов служат мостом для определения важности связи между объектами модальности изображения и контекстными словами модальности текста, чтобы построить кросс-модальный граф для каждого мультимодального экземпляра. Кроме того, мы разработали межмодальную сверточную сеть графов, чтобы понять несоответствие между способами обнаружения мультимодального сарказма. Обширные экспериментальные результаты и углубленный анализ показывают, что наша модель достигает самых современных показателей в мультимодальном обнаружении сарказма.', 'ga': 'Agus an méadú ar an éileamh atá ar theachtaireachtaí ilmhódacha a phostáil ar líne, rinneadh go leor staidéar le déanaí ag baint úsáide as faisnéis théacsúil agus amhairc chun searbhas ilmhódach a bhrath. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar bhrath searbhas ilmhódúil ó pheirspictíocht úrnua trí ghraf trasmhódúil a chruthú do gach cás chun an caidreamh íorónta idir módúlachtaí téacsúla agus amhairc a tharraingt go follasach. Go sonrach, aimsímid ar dtús na réada atá péireáilte le cur síos ar mhodhúlacht na híomhá, rud a chuireann ar ár gcumas faisnéis thábhachtach amhairc a fhoghlaim. Ansin, déantar cur síos ar na réada a úsáid mar dhroichead chun an tábhacht a bhaineann leis an gcomhlachas idir cuspóirí módúlacht na híomhá agus focail chomhthéacs módúlachta an téacs a chinneadh, chun graf trasmhódúil a chruthú do gach cás ilmhódúil. Ina theannta sin, ceapaimid gréasán conbhlóideach graif trasmhódúil chun ciall a bhaint as an gcaidreamh neamhréir idir na rialacha mionsonraithe chun searbhas ilmhódach a bhrath. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha fairsinge agus mionanailís go mbaineann ár múnla feidhmíocht úrscothach amach maidir le braite searbhas ilmhódaigh.', 'hu': 'A multimodális üzenetek online közzétételének növekvő népszerűségével számos közelmúltbeli tanulmányt végeztek a multimodális szarkazmus felismeréséhez szükséges szöveges és vizuális információkat felhasználva. Jelen tanulmányban a multimodális szarkazmus detektálását új perspektívából vizsgáljuk úgy, hogy minden egyes példányhoz keresztmodális gráfot készítünk, hogy kifejezetten felhívjuk a szöveges és vizuális módok ironikus kapcsolatait. Konkrétan először a képmód leírásával párosított objektumokat észleljük, lehetővé téve fontos vizuális információk megismerését. Ezután az objektumok leírásai hídként szolgálnak, hogy meghatározzák a képmód objektumai és a szövegmód kontextuális szavai közötti kapcsolat fontosságát, hogy minden egyes multimodális példányra keresztmodális gráfot készítsenek. Ezenkívül egy multimodális szarkazmus felismerésének módjai közötti inkonszolúciós kapcsolatokat dolgozunk ki. A kiterjedt kísérleti eredmények és a mélyreható elemzések azt mutatják, hogy modellünk a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el multimodális szarkazmus detektálásában.', 'ka': 'მულტიმოდიალური შეტყობინებების ინტერნეტის პოლუბარიტებით უფრო მეტი ახალი სწავლის გამოყენება ტექსტულური და ვიზუალური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება მრავალური მოდიალური საპკასმის ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მრავალური მოდელური საპკესტიკის განახლებას, რომელიც პრომენტიკური პერვიკუტიკური განახლებით, ყველა ინსტაციაში კრესმოდელური გრაფიკის შექმნა, რომ ტექსტულ და ვიზუალურ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ პირველად განვიცნობით გასაკუთრებული ვიზუალური ინფორმაციის გასაკუთრებით გამოსახულებული ობიექტები. შემდეგ, ობიექტების აღწერები იყენებენ როგორც ბრძანი, რომ განსაზღვრთო სურათის მოდელიობის და ტექსტური მოდელიობის სიტყვების აღწერების გასანიშვნელობის მნიშვნელობა, რადგან ყოველ მრავალ მოდელიური ინ დამატებით, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ კონტუალური გრაფიკის კონტუალური ქსელი, რომელიც უნდა გავაკეთებთ კონტუალური გრაფიკის შესახებ, რომელიც მრავალური მოდელური საპკასმის გან ექსპერიმენტიური გამოცდილებები და განსაზღვრებული ანალიზია, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის მონაცემები მრავალური საპკაზმის განსაზღვრებით მიიღება.', 'el': 'Με την αυξανόμενη δημοτικότητα της ανάρτησης πολυμορφικών μηνυμάτων στο διαδίκτυο, πολλές πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν πραγματοποιηθεί χρησιμοποιώντας τόσο γραπτές όσο και οπτικές πληροφορίες για την ανίχνευση πολυμορφικού σαρκασμού. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διερευνούμε την ανίχνευση πολυτροπικού σαρκασμού από μια νέα προοπτική, κατασκευάζοντας ένα διαγραφικό για κάθε περίπτωση για να σχεδιάσουμε ρητά τις ειρωνικές σχέσεις μεταξύ κειμένων και οπτικών μορφών. Συγκεκριμένα, εντοπίζουμε πρώτα τα αντικείμενα σε συνδυασμό με περιγραφές της μορφής εικόνας, επιτρέποντας την εκμάθηση σημαντικών οπτικών πληροφοριών. Στη συνέχεια, οι περιγραφές των αντικειμένων εξυπηρετούνται ως γέφυρα για να καθοριστεί η σημασία της συσχέτισης μεταξύ των αντικειμένων της τροπικότητας εικόνας και των περιεχομένων λέξεων της τροπικότητας κειμένου, έτσι ώστε να δημιουργηθεί ένα διαγραφικό για κάθε περίπτωση πολλαπλών τροπών. Επιπλέον, σχεδιάζουμε ένα δίκτυο διαστροφικών γραφικών διαστάσεων για να κατανοήσουμε τις σχέσεις ασυμφωνίας μεταξύ των μορφών ανίχνευσης πολυμορφικού σαρκασμού. Εκτεταμένα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα και σε βάθος ανάλυση δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει υπερσύγχρονες επιδόσεις στην ανίχνευση πολυμορφικού σαρκασμού.', 'lt': 'Kadangi daugiarūšio ryšio pranešimai skelbiami internete vis dažniau, atlikta daug neseniai atliktų tyrimų, kuriuose naudojama tekstinė ir vizualinė informacija daugiarūšio sarkazmo aptikimui. Šiame dokumente iš naujo tiriame daugiarūšio sarkazmo nustatymą, kiekvienam atvejui parengdami įvairiarūšį grafiką, kad būtų aiškiai apibūdinti ironiniai tekstinių ir vizualinių būdų santykiai. Konkrečiai, pirmą kartą aptinkame objektus su vaizdo režimo aprašymais, leidžiančiais mokytis svarbios vizualinės informacijos. Then, the descriptions of the objects are served as a bridge to determine the importance of the association between the objects of image modality and the contextual words of text modality, so as to build a cross-modal graph for each multi-modal instance.  Be to, sukuriame įvairiarūšio grafiko konvoliucinį tinklą, kad būtų galima suprasti įvairiarūšio sarkazmo nustatymo būdų nesuderinamumą. Išsamūs eksperimentiniai rezultatai ir nuodugni analizė rodo, kad mūsų modelis pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus daugiarūšio sarkazmo nustatymo srityje.', 'it': "Con la crescente popolarità della pubblicazione di messaggi multimodali online, molti studi recenti sono stati condotti utilizzando sia informazioni testuali che visive per la rilevazione del sarcasmo multimodale. In questo articolo, esaminiamo la rilevazione del sarcasmo multimodale da una prospettiva inedita costruendo un grafico cross-modale per ogni istanza per disegnare esplicitamente le relazioni ironiche tra modalità testuali e visive. Nello specifico, rileviamo prima gli oggetti abbinati alle descrizioni della modalità dell'immagine, consentendo l'apprendimento di importanti informazioni visive. Poi, le descrizioni degli oggetti sono servite da ponte per determinare l'importanza dell'associazione tra gli oggetti della modalità immagine e le parole contestuali della modalità testuale, in modo da costruire un grafico cross-modale per ogni istanza multimodale. Inoltre, elaboriamo una rete convoluzionale di grafici cross-modali per dare un senso alle relazioni di incongruenza tra modalità di rilevazione del sarcasmo multimodale. Ampi risultati sperimentali e analisi approfondite dimostrano che il nostro modello raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia nel rilevamento del sarcasmo multimodale.", 'mk': 'Со зголемената популарност на објавувањето мултимодилни пораки онлајн, многу неодамнешни студии се спроведени користејќи текстуални и визуелни информации за детекција мултимодилни сарказми. Во овој весник, ние го истражуваме детекцијата на мултимодалниот сарказам од нова перспектива со изградба на крстомодален граф за секој пример за експлицитно да ги цртаме ироничните односи помеѓу текстуалните и визуелните моделности. Специфично, прво ги детектираме објектите парирани со описите на моделноста на сликата, овозможувајќи учење на важни визуелни информации. Потоа, описите на објектите се служат како мост за да се одреди важноста на асоцијацијата помеѓу објектите на модијалноста на сликата и контекстните зборови на модијалноста на текстот, со цел да се изгради крстомодален граф за секој мултимодален пример. Покрај тоа, ние дизајнираме крстомодна графска конволуционална мрежа за да сфатиме какви се несовпаѓачките односи помеѓу модијалитетите за детекција на мултимодилниот сарказам. Широки експериментални резултати и длабока анализа покажуваат дека нашиот модел постигнува најдобра резултат во детекција на мултимодален сарказам.', 'ms': 'Dengan meningkat popularitas posting mesej multi modal online, banyak kajian baru-baru ini telah dilakukan menggunakan maklumat teks dan visual untuk pengesan sarkasma multimodal. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki pengesan sarkasma multi modal dari perspektif baru dengan membina graf transmodal untuk setiap contoh untuk melukis secara eksplicit hubungan ironi antara modaliti teks dan visual. Secara khusus, kita pertama-tama mengesan objek berpasangan dengan deskripsi modaliti imej, membolehkan pembelajaran maklumat visual penting. Kemudian, deskripsi objek dilayani sebagai jambatan untuk menentukan kepentingan hubungan antara objek modaliti imej dan kata-kata kontekstual modaliti teks, supaya membina graf transmodal untuk setiap contoh multi modal. Selain itu, kami merancang rangkaian konvolusi graf melintasi modal untuk memahami hubungan ketidaksamaan antara modaliti untuk pengesan sarkasma multimodal. Hasil eksperimen yang luas dan analisis dalam-dalam menunjukkan bahawa model kita mencapai prestasi terbaik dalam pengesan sarkasma multi modal.', 'ml': 'മുള്\u200dട്ടിമോഡല്\u200d സന്ദേശങ്ങള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈനില്\u200d പോസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ദൃശ്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പല മോഡില്\u200d സാര്\u200dക്കാസം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ ഉദാഹരണത്തിനും ഒരു ക്രിസ്മോഡാള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ Specifically, we first detect the objects paired with descriptions of the image modality, enabling the learning of important visual information.  പിന്നീട്, വസ്തുക്കളുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പാലിയായി സേവിക്കുന്നു. ഇമേജിന്റെ മോഡിയലിന്റെ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയിലുള്ള പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രാധാന്യം തീരുമാനിക് അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ക്രിസ്മോഡാല്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പല മോഡിമോഡില്\u200d സർക്കാസം കണ്ടെത്തുന് വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങളും ആഴത്തിലെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങളും കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പല-മോഡിയല്\u200d സർക്കാസം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതി', 'kk': 'Көп модельді хаттарды онлайн жіберу үшін көп жаңа зерттеулерді көп мәтін және визуалдық мәліметтерді көп модельді саркассмды анықтау үшін қолданылады. Бұл қағазда, біз көп модалдық саркассмды жаңа перспективадан байқау арқылы, әрбір данасы үшін бірнеше модалдық график құрылып, мәтін және көрінетін қасиеттер арасындағы ирониялық қатынастарды түсініп көрдік Ескерту үшін біріншіден кескін модельдігінің сипаттамасын біріктіріп, маңызды көрінетін мәліметті оқытуға мүмкіндік береді. Содан кейін нысандардың сипаттамалары көпшілік ретінде кескін моделитетінің нысандарының мен мәтін моделитетінің көпшілік сөздерінің қатынасын анықтау үшін көпшілік ретінде қолданылады, сондықтан әрбір көпшілік модель модел Қосымша, біз көптеген модалдық саркассмды анықтау үшін көптеген режімдер арасындағы қатынастығын түсіндіру үшін көптеген график көптеген құрылымыз. Өзгертілген тәжірибе нәтижелері және түсінікті анализ үлгіміздің көптеген модалдық сарказмды анықтау үшін көптеген әртүрлі жағдайды жеткізеді.', 'mn': 'Олон загварын мэдээллийг онлайн интернет хэвлэхэд нэмэгдсэн олон саяхан судалгааны ажиллагаа олон загварын тархалтын мэдээллийг ашиглаж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид шинэ харцгаанаас олон моделийн саркассмыг судалж, жишээ бүр давхар моделийн график бүтээж, текстур болон харцгаан үйл явдлын хоорондох гайхамшигт харилцаа зурж байна. Ялангуяа, бид анх зураг загварын тодорхойлолтой холбоотой объектуудыг олж, чухал харагдах мэдээллийг сурах боломжтой болгодог. Ингээд, объектын тайлбар нь зураг загварын хоорондын холбоотой байдлын чухал байдлыг тодорхойлдохын тулд хөлөг болгож, олон модалын жишээ бүрт давхар модалын график бий болгож байна. Үүнээс гадна бид олон модуль саркассмын нээлттэй байдлын харилцааны тухай ойлгохын тулд олон модуль график хөгжлийн сүлжээ төсөөл. Ихэнх туршилтын үр дүнг, гүн гүнзгий шинжилгээ нь бидний загвар нь олон моделийн саркассмын шинжилгээнд оршиж чаддаг.', 'pl': 'Wraz z rosnącą popularnością publikowania komunikatów multimodalnych online, przeprowadzono wiele ostatnich badań wykorzystujących zarówno informacje tekstowe, jak i wizualne do wykrywania multimodalnego sarkazmu. W artykule badamy wykrywanie sarkazmu multimodalnego z nowej perspektywy poprzez konstruowanie wykresu crossmodalnego dla każdego przypadku, aby wyraźnie narysować ironiczne relacje między modalnościami tekstowymi i wizualnymi. W szczególności najpierw wykrywamy obiekty połączone z opisami modalności obrazu, umożliwiając poznanie ważnych informacji wizualnych. Następnie opisy obiektów służą jako most do określenia znaczenia skojarzenia między obiektami modalności obrazu a kontekstowymi słowami modalności tekstowej, tak aby zbudować wykres crossmodalny dla każdej instancji multimodalnej. Ponadto opracowujemy intermodalną sieć konwolucyjną wykresu, aby uzyskać sens związków niezgodności między modalnościami wykrywania multimodalnego sarkazmu. Obszerne wyniki eksperymentalne i dogłębna analiza pokazują, że nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejsze wyniki w wykrywaniu sarkazmu multimodalnego.', 'mt': 'Bil-popolarità dejjem tikber tal-istazzjonar ta’ messaġġi multimodali onlajn, twettqu bosta studji riċenti bl-użu kemm ta’ informazzjoni testwali kif ukoll viżwali għall-individwazzjoni ta’ sarkazmu multimodali. F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw l-iskoperta ta’ sarkazmu multimodali minn perspettiva ġdida billi nibnu graff transmodali għal kull każ biex inġibdu b’mod espliċitu r-relazzjonijiet ironiċi bejn il-modalitajiet testwali u viżivi. Speċifikament, l-ewwel niskopru l-oġġetti flimkien ma’ deskrizzjonijiet tal-modalità tal-immaġni, li jippermettu t-tagħlim ta’ informazzjoni viżiva importanti. Imbagħad, id-deskrizzjonijiet tal-oġġetti jservu bħala pont biex jiddeterminaw l-importanza tal-as so ċjazzjoni bejn l-oġġetti tal-modalità tal-immaġni u l-kliem kuntestwali tal-modalità tat-test, sabiex jinbena graff trasmodali għal kull eżempju multimodali. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nħejju netwerk konvoluzzjonali tal-graff transmodali biex tagħmel sens tar-relazzjonijiet ta’ inkogruenza bejn il-modalitajiet għall-individwazzjoni tas-sarkasmu multimodali. Riżultati esperimentali estensivi u analiżi fil-fond juru li l-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata fid-detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu multimodali.', 'ro': 'Odată cu popularitatea crescândă a postării de mesaje multimodale online, au fost efectuate multe studii recente utilizând atât informații textuale, cât și vizuale pentru detectarea sarcasmului multimodal. În această lucrare, investigăm detectarea sarcasmului multimodal dintr-o perspectivă nouă prin construirea unui grafic transmodal pentru fiecare instanță pentru a desena în mod explicit relațiile ironice dintre modalitățile textuale și vizuale. Mai precis, detectăm mai întâi obiectele asociate cu descrierile modalității imaginii, permițând învățarea unor informații vizuale importante. Apoi, descrierile obiectelor sunt servite ca o punte pentru a determina importanța asocierii dintre obiectele modalității imaginii și cuvintele contextuale ale modalității text, astfel încât să se construiască un grafic cross-modal pentru fiecare instanță multimodală. Mai mult decât atât, concepem o rețea convoluțională de grafic transmodal pentru a face sens relațiilor de incongruență dintre modalitățile de detectare a sarcasmului multimodal. Rezultatele experimentale extinse și analizele aprofundate arată că modelul nostru atinge performanțe de ultimă generație în detectarea sarcasmului multimodal.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් පණිවිඩය අන්ලයාන් එක්ක පැත්තට වැඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ගොඩක් අළුත් පරීක්ෂණ අභ්\u200dයාස කරලා තියෙනවා වග මේ පත්තරේ අපි ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් සාර්කාස්ම් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අවස්ථානයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා හැම උදාහරණයක්ම විශේෂයෙන් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම පින්තූර ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ විස්තරණය සමඟ සම්බන්ධ වෙන් ඊට පස්සේ, පින්තූර ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපය සහ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූපයේ ප්\u200dරතිරූ තවත්, අපි ක්\u200dරීස් මෝඩාල් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් හොයාගන්න සංවේදනයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් මොඩාල් මෝඩාල් සාර්කාස් පරි විශාල පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය සහ ගොඩක් විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක තත්වය', 'no': 'Med den aukande populariteten av posting av fleire modal meldingar på nettet har mange nyleg studier utført som brukar både tekst og visuell informasjon for å finna fleire modal sarkasm. I denne papiret undersøker vi fleire modal sarkasm-oppdaging frå ein novel perspektiv ved å konstruere eit krysmodal graf for kvar eksempel for å eksplisisere teikna ironiske forhold mellom tekst og visuelle modular. Spesielt, vi finn først objektet som er saman med skildringar av biletmedigheiten, og slår på å lære viktige visualinformasjon. Deretter vert objekta skildringane kalla som ein bridge for å bestemme viktigheten for tilknytinga mellom objekta av biletmodialitet og kontekstære ord av tekstmodulitet, slik at du bygger eit krysmodal graf for kvar fleire modal instans. I tillegg bestemmer vi eit konvolusjonell nettverk med krysmodal graf for å gjere mening av ulikhetsrelasjonane mellom modaliteter for multi modal sarkasm-oppdaging. Ekstra eksperimentelle resultat og i dybde-analyser viser at modellen vårt når det gjer tilstanden av kunsten i multimodalet oppdaging av sarkasm.', 'so': 'Markii aad internetka ku soo dirto farriin badan oo aad u sii kordhiso, waxaa lagu sameeyay waxbarasho badan oo la isticmaalayo isticmaalka macluumaadka qoraalka iyo waxyaabaha aragga ah oo la soo ogaanayo baaritaanka sarkaamka kala duduwan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baaraynaa baaritaanka sarcasm oo kala duduwan aragtida warqadda, si bayaan ah ugu dhaqdhaqaaqno xiriirka dhaqanka iyo qaababka aragtida. Si gaar ah, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu ogaanaynaa alaabta la isku xiriiray sawirka qaabka sawirka, waxaynu baranaynaa barashada macluumaadka muhiimka ah ee muuqata. Markaas waxaa loo isticmaalaa sawirida alaabta, si loo caddeeyo muhiimka iskaashatada u dhexeeya alaabta qaabka sawirka iyo hadallada ku saabsan qaabka qoraalka, si loo dhiso sawir-qaab kala duduwan tusaale kasta. Furthermore, waxaynu sameynaa shabakad rasmi ah oo kala duduwan si aan u ogaano xiriirka aan shaqeyn karin oo u dhexeeya qaababka baaritaanka sarcaska kala duduwan. Shahaadada baaritaanka dheer iyo baaritaanka mool dheer waxay muuqataa in modellkayagu uu helo tababarka farshaxanka kala duduwan baaritaanka sarcaska.', 'sr': 'Sa povećanjem popularnosti postavljanja multimodalnih poruka na internetu, provedena je mnogo nedavnih ispitivanja korištenjem tekstualnih i vizualnih informacija za multimodalno otkrivanje sarkazma. U ovom papiru istražujemo otkrivanje multimodalnog sarkazma iz novog perspektiva, konstrujući krsno modalni grafik za svaki primer da bismo izrazili ironičke odnose između tekstualnih i vizualnih modaliteta. Posebno, prvo otkrivamo objekte povezani sa opisom modaliteta slika, omogućavajući učenje važnih vizualnih informacija. Tada su opisi objekata služeni kao most da odredi važnost asocijacije između objekata modaliteta slika i kontekstualne reči modaliteta teksta, kako bi izgradili cross-modalni grafik za svaki multimodalni primer. Osim toga, mi smislimo konvolucionalnu mrežu preko modalnog grafika kako bi imali smisla o nepoštenosti odnosa između modaliteta za multimodalno detektivno detektivno sarkazam. Eksperimentalni rezultati i duboka analiza pokazuju da naš model postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u multimodalnom detekciji sarkazma.', 'sv': 'Med den ökande populariteten av att posta multimodala meddelanden på nätet har många nyligen genomförda studier genomförts med hjälp av både textinformation och visuell information för multimodal sarkasm detektering. I denna uppsats undersöker vi multimodal sarkasm detektering ur ett nytt perspektiv genom att konstruera en tvärmodal graf för varje instans för att uttryckligen dra de ironiska relationerna mellan text och visuella modaliteter. Specifikt upptäcker vi först objekten i kombination med beskrivningar av bildsättet, vilket möjliggör inlärning av viktig visuell information. Därefter används beskrivningarna av objekten som en bro för att avgöra betydelsen av associationen mellan objekten i bildmodalitet och de kontextuella orden i textmodalitet, så att man bygger en tvärmodal graf för varje multimodal instans. Dessutom utformar vi ett tvärmodalt grafkonvulutionsnätverk för att förstå inkonsekvensrelationerna mellan modaliteter för multimodal sarkasm detektering. Omfattande experimentella resultat och djupgående analyser visar att vår modell uppnår toppmoderna prestanda inom multimodal sarkasm detektering.', 'ta': 'பல மாதிரி செய்திகளை இணையத்தில் அனுப்புவதற்கான அதிகப்படுத்தப்பட்ட மகிழ்ச்சியுடன், அண்மையில் பல மாதிரி செயல் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான மிகவும் நெ இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய காட்சியிலிருந்து பல-மாற்று பிரச்சனை கண்டுபிடிப்பை தேடுகிறோம் ஒவ்வொரு நிகழ்விற்கும் மாற்று வரைபடம் உருவாக் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் முதலில் பொருட்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் பிம்பத்தின் வகையின் விளக்கங்களுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளத பிறகு, பொருள்களின் விவரிப்பு பாலமாக பயன்படுத்தப்படும் பிம்பத்தின் முக்கியத்தை தீர்மானி அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் ஒரு சிறு மாற்று வரைபடம் சாதாரண பிணையத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம் பல மாற்று பரிமாற்றம் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான தொடர்புகளை புர விரிவான சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'بہت سی موڈال پیغامات آنلاین کے پیغام پہنچانے کے لئے بہت زیادہ مشهور مطالعہ کے ساتھ بہت سی اگلوں کی مطالعہ کی گئی ہے کہ بہت سی موڈال سارکاسم شناسایے کے لئے textual اور visual information کا استعمال کرتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نئی نظر سے بہت سی موڈال سارکاسم شناسایی کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، ہر مثال کے لئے ایک کرس موڈال گراف بناتے ہیں تاکہ اس کے ذریعہ سے تفصیل اور بصیرت کے درمیان ایرونیک رابطہ کریں. مخصوص طور پر، ہم پہلی بار تصویر موڈلیٹ کی توصیف کے ساتھ جوڑے ہوئے objectوں کو پتہ لگاتے ہیں، جو اہم بصیرت معلومات کی تعلیم کرتی ہیں۔ اس کے بعد، اتحادیوں کی تعریف پول کے طور پر استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں کہ تصویر موڈلیلی کے وسائل اور متوسط کلمات کے متوسط کلمات کی تعریف کا اہم مقرر کرے، تاکہ ہر متوسط موڈلیل مثال کے لئے ایک کرس موڈال گراف بنائے۔ اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک کرس موڈال گراف کی تصویر کررہے ہیں کہ بہت سی موڈال سارکاسم شناسایے کے لئے موڈیلوں کے درمیان غلطی کا ارتباط معلوم کریں۔ اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش کے نتائج اور عمیق تحقیقات کی تحقیقات دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل بہت سی موڈال سارکاسم کی آزمائش میں موجود ہے۔', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik tarkibi xabarlarni online postlash uchun ko'pchilik o'qituvchilari bir nechta ko'pchilik sarkasm qidirish uchun textual va visual maʼlumot yordamida bajarildi. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha modal sarkasm aniqlanishni novel shaklidan qidirishni boshqaramiz va har bir misol uchun qo'llab-modal grafikni yaratish mumkin. Matn va ko'rinish usullari orasidagi ironik aloqalarini aniqlash. Koʻrsatilgan, birinchi marta rasm modulining taʼriflari bilan bir necha obʼektlarni aniqlash mumkin, muhim koʻrinish haqida o'rganish mumkin. Name Ko'rsatganda, biz bir necha modal sarkasm qidirish usullarning orasidagi murakkablik tarmoqni aniqlashga qaramamiz. Koʻproq tajriba natijalari va muvaffaqiyatli aniqlash natijalarini ko'rsatish mumkin, bizning modelmiz ko'plab-modal sarkasm aniqlanishda shaxsiyatli holatni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Với sự phổ biến của việc post các thông điệp đa phương trên mạng ngày càng nhiều, nhiều nghiên cứu gần đây được thực hiện, nhờ kết cấu hình và hình ảnh thông tin để phát hiện sự mỉa mai đa phương. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi điều tra khả năng phát hiện mỉa mai đa phương khác nhau từ một viễn cảnh mới bằng cách thiết lập một đồ thị khác nhau cho mỗi ví dụ để vẽ rõ ràng mối quan hệ mỉa mai giữa phương thức văn hóa và hình ảnh. Cụ thể, chúng ta lần đầu tiên phát hiện các vật thể kết hợp với mô tả về thể hình ảnh, cho phép học hỏi các thông tin quan trọng về hình ảnh. Sau đó, mô tả các vật thể được dùng như một cây cầu để xác định tầm quan trọng của sự liên kết giữa các vật thể hình ảnh và các từ ngữ ngữ chung của Chế độ văn bản, để tạo ra một đồ thị khác phương cho mỗi trường đa phương. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi lập ra một mạng lưới liên kết đồ thị khác phương để hiểu rõ mối quan hệ bất tiện giữa phương thức phát hiện mỉa mai đa phương thần. Kết quả thử nghiệm đầy đủ và phân tích sâu sắc cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tuyệt vời trong việc phát hiện mỉa mai nhiều phương thần.', 'da': 'Med den stigende popularitet af at sende multimodale meddelelser online, er mange nylige undersøgelser blevet udført ved hjælp af både tekst- og visuel information til multimodal sarkasme detektion. I denne artikel undersøger vi multimodal sarkasme detektion fra et nyt perspektiv ved at konstruere en tværmodal graf for hvert enkelt eksempel for eksplicit at tegne de ironiske relationer mellem tekst og visuel modalitet. Specielt opdager vi først objekterne parret med beskrivelser af billedmodaliteten, hvilket gør det muligt at lære vigtig visuel information. Derefter tjener beskrivelserne af objekterne som en bro til at bestemme betydningen af forbindelsen mellem objekterne i billedmodalitet og de kontekstuelle ord i tekstmodalitet, således at der opbygges en tværmodal graf for hver multimodal forekomst. Desuden udvikler vi et tværmodalt grafkonvulutivt netværk for at give mening i uoverensstemmelserne mellem modaliteterne for multimodal sarkasme detektion. Omfattende eksperimentelle resultater og dybdegående analyser viser, at vores model opnår state-of-the-art ydeevne inden for multimodal sarkasme detektion.', 'bg': 'С нарастващата популярност на публикуването на мултимодални съобщения онлайн, много скорошни проучвания са проведени, използвайки текстова и визуална информация за мултимодално откриване на сарказъм. В тази статия ние изследваме мултимодалното откриване на сарказъм от нова гледна точка, като конструираме кръстомодна графика за всеки случай, за да очертаем изрично ироничните отношения между текстовите и визуалните модали. По-конкретно, първо откриваме обектите, съчетани с описания на модалността на изображението, което позволява изучаването на важна визуална информация. След това описанията на обектите служат като мост, за да се определи значението на асоциацията между обектите на модалността на изображението и контекстните думи на модалността на текста, така че да се изгради междумодална графика за всяка мултимодална инстанция. Освен това, разработваме интермодална графична конволюционна мрежа, за да разберем несъответствията между модалите за мултимодално откриване на сарказъм. Обширни експериментални резултати и задълбочен анализ показват, че нашият модел постига най-съвременни резултати в откриването на мултимодален сарказъм.', 'nl': 'Met de toenemende populariteit van het online plaatsen van multimodale berichten, zijn veel recente studies uitgevoerd met behulp van zowel tekstuele als visuele informatie voor multimodale sarcasme detectie. In dit artikel onderzoeken we multimodaal sarcasme detectie vanuit een nieuw perspectief door voor elk geval een crossmodale grafiek te bouwen om expliciet de ironische relaties tussen tekstuele en visuele modaliteiten te tekenen. In het bijzonder detecteren we eerst de objecten gekoppeld aan beschrijvingen van de beeldmodaliteit, waardoor belangrijke visuele informatie kan worden geleerd. Vervolgens worden de beschrijvingen van de objecten gediend als een brug om het belang van de associatie tussen de objecten van beeldmodaliteit en de contextuele woorden van tekstmodaliteit te bepalen, om een crossmodale grafiek te bouwen voor elke multimodale instantie. Verder ontwikkelen we een crossmodaal grafiekconvolutioneel netwerk om de incongruïteitsverhoudingen tussen modaliteiten voor multimodaal sarcasme detectie zinvol te maken. Uitgebreide experimentele resultaten en diepgaande analyse tonen aan dat ons model state-of-the-art prestaties behaalt in multimodaal sarcasme detectie.', 'hr': 'S povećanjem popularnosti objavljivanja multimodalnih poruka na internetu, provedena je mnogo nedavnih ispitivanja korištenjem tekstualnih i vizualnih informacija za otkrivanje multimodalnih sarkazama. U ovom papiru istražujemo otkrivanje multimodalnog sarkazma iz novog perspektiva, konstruirajući cross-modalni grafik za svaki primjer kako bismo izrazili ironičke odnose između tekstualnih i vizualnih načina. Posebno, prvo otkrivamo objekte povezani s opisima modaliteta slike, omogućavajući učenje važnih vizualnih informacija. Tada su opisi objekata služeni kao most kako bi utvrdila važnost udruženja između objekata modaliteta slika i kontekstualne riječi modaliteta teksta, kako bi izgradila cross-modalni grafik za svaku multimodalnu primjeru. Osim toga, mi smislimo konvolucionalnu mrežu preko modalnog grafika kako bi imali smisla o nepravednosti odnosa između modaliteta za multimodalno detektivno detektivno sarkazam. Eksperimentalni rezultati i duboka analiza pokazuju da naš model postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u multimodalnom otkrivanju sarkazama.', 'de': 'Mit der zunehmenden Popularität multimodaler Nachrichten online zu veröffentlichen, wurden viele aktuelle Studien durchgeführt, die sowohl textuelle als auch visuelle Informationen zur multimodalen Sarkasmus-Erkennung verwenden. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir multimodalen Sarkasmus-Nachweis aus einer neuen Perspektive, indem wir für jede Instanz einen crossmodalen Graphen konstruieren, um die ironischen Beziehungen zwischen textuellen und visuellen Modalitäten explizit zu zeichnen. Konkret erkennen wir zunächst die Objekte gepaart mit Beschreibungen der Bildmodalität und ermöglichen so das Erlernen wichtiger visueller Informationen. Anschließend dienen die Beschreibungen der Objekte als Brücke, um die Bedeutung der Assoziation zwischen den Objekten der Bildmodalität und den kontextuellen Wörtern der Textmodalität zu bestimmen, um für jede multimodale Instanz einen crossmodalen Graphen zu erstellen. Darüber hinaus entwickeln wir ein intermodales Graphenfalznetzwerk, um die Inkongrualitätsbeziehungen zwischen Modalitäten für die multimodale Sarkasmuserkennung zu verstehen. Umfangreiche experimentelle Ergebnisse und eingehende Analysen zeigen, dass unser Modell modernste Leistungen in der multimodalen Sarkasmus-Detektion erzielt.', 'id': 'Dengan meningkat popularitas posting pesan multi modal online, banyak studi baru-baru ini telah dilakukan menggunakan informasi tekstual dan visual untuk deteksi sarkasme multimodal. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki deteksi sarkasme multi modal dari perspektif baru dengan membangun grafik transmodal untuk setiap contoh untuk secara eksplicit menggambar hubungan ironis antara modalitas tekstual dan visual. Secara spesifik, pertama-tama kita mendeteksi objek berpasangan dengan deskripsi mode gambar, memungkinkan belajar informasi visual penting. Kemudian, deskripsi objek dilayani sebagai jembatan untuk menentukan pentingnya asosiasi antara objek dari modalitas gambar dan kata-kata kontekstual dari modalitas teks, untuk membangun grafik transmodal untuk setiap contoh multi modal. Selain itu, kami merancang jaringan konvolusi grafik transmodal untuk memahami hubungan ketidaksamaan antara modalitas untuk deteksi sarkasme multi modal. Hasil eksperimen yang luas dan analisis dalam menunjukkan bahwa model kita mencapai prestasi terbaik dalam deteksi sarkasme multi modal.', 'ko': '온라인에서 다중모드적 정보를 발표하는 것이 날로 보급됨에 따라 최근의 많은 연구들은 텍스트와 시각적 정보를 이용하여 다중모드적 풍자 검측을 하고 있다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 각도에서 다중모드 풍자 검측을 연구했고 모든 실례를 위해 다중모드도를 구축하여 텍스트와 시각모드 간의 반풍자 관계를 명확하게 그렸다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 먼저 이미지 모드 묘사와 일치하는 대상을 검측하여 중요한 시각 정보를 배울 수 있다.그 다음에 대상의 묘사를 교량으로 삼아 이미지 모드 대상과 텍스트 모드 상하문어 간의 관련 중요성을 확정하고 모든 다중 모드 실례에 크로스 모드맵을 구축한다.그 밖에 우리는 다중모드 볼륨 네트워크를 설계하여 다중모드 풍자 검측에서 모드 간의 불일치 관계를 이해했다.대량의 실험 결과와 깊이 있는 분석을 통해 우리의 모델은 다중모드 풍자 검측에서 가장 선진적인 성능에 이르렀다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Kwa kuongezeka kwa umaarufu wa kuandika ujumbe wa jumbe nyingi mtandaoni, tafiti nyingi za hivi karibuni zimekuwa zikifanyika kwa kutumia taarifa za teknolojia na picha kwa ajili ya kutambua kemikali mbalimbali. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza utambuzi wa kemikali wa aina mbalimbali kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa riwaya kwa kutengeneza picha ya mpira kwa kila mfano kuonyesha mahusiano ya kejeli kati ya njia za kuandika na kuona. Kwa ujumla, kwanza tunagundua vitu vilivyochanganyika na maelezo ya namna ya picha, na kuwawezesha kujifunza taarifa muhimu za kuona. Kisha, maelezo ya vitu vinatumika kama daraja ya kutambua umuhimu wa ushirikiano kati ya vitu vya utamaduni wa picha na maneno ya kawaida ya mfumo wa maandishi, ili kujenga picha kwa kila aina ya aina mbalimbali. Zaidi ya hayo, tunatengeneza mtandao wa mpiga picha kwa ajili ya kuelezea mahusiano ya ukosefu kati ya utamaduni wa kejeli wa aina mbalimbali. Matokeo mengi ya majaribio na uchambuzi wa kina unaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inafanikiwa utendaji wa hali ya sanaa katika uchunguzi wa kejeli wa aina mbalimbali.', 'fa': 'با افزایش شهرت پیغام\u200cهای بسیاری در اینترنت، تحقیقات اخیراً با استفاده از اطلاعات textual و visual برای شناسایی سارکاسم\u200cهای متعدد مدال انجام شده است. در این کاغذ، ما با ساختن یک گراف متوسط modal برای هر مثال رابطه\u200cهای مسخره بین روش\u200cهای متوسط و دیده\u200cای تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. دقیقا، اولین بار جفت\u200cها را با توضیح\u200cهای modality تصویر شناسایی می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتوانیم یادگیری اطلاعات بینایی مهم را قادر کنیم. سپس، توضیح اشیاء به عنوان پل خدمت می\u200cشوند تا تعریف اهمیت اتصال بین اشیاء مدل تصویر و کلمات متوسط متن را برای هر مثال متوسط مدل تعریف کند. علاوه بر این، ما یک شبکه متغیر متغیر مدال را طراحی می\u200cکنیم تا درباره رابطه\u200cهای غیرقابل توجه بین modalities for multi modal sarcasm detection. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایش گسترده و تحلیل عمیق نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما در آزمایش سارکاسم\u200cهای متعدد مدل رسیده است.', 'sq': 'Me popullaritetin në rritje të postimit të mesazheve multimodale në internet, janë kryer shumë studime të fundit duke përdorur si informacionin tekstual ashtu edhe vizual për zbulimin e sarkazmit multi modal. Në këtë letër, ne hetojmë zbulimin e sarkazmit multi modal nga një perspektivë e re duke ndërtuar një grafik transmodal për secilin rast për të tërhequr shprehësisht marrëdhëniet ironike midis modaliteteve tekstuale dhe vizuale. Në mënyrë specifike, ne së pari zbulojmë objektet e barazuar me përshkrimin e modalitetit të imazhit, duke mundësuar mësimin e informacionit të rëndësishëm vizual. Pastaj, përshkrimet e objekteve shërbehen si një urë për të përcaktuar rëndësinë e shoqërimit midis objekteve të modalitetit të imazhit dhe fjalëve kontekstuale të modalitetit të tekstit, në mënyrë që të ndërtohet një grafik transmodal për çdo shembull multi modal. Përveç kësaj, ne krijojmë një rrjet konvolutiv grafik transmodal për të bërë kuptim të marrëdhënieve të pakëndshme midis modaliteteve për zbulimin e sarkazmit multi modal. Rezultatet e gjera eksperimentale dhe analizat e thella tregojnë se modeli ynë arrin shfaqje më të larta në zbulimin e sarkazmit multi modal.', 'af': "Met die grootste populariteit van multimodaale boodskappe aanlyn te stuur, is baie onlangse studie uitgevoer met gebruik van beide tekstuele en visuele inligting vir multimodaale sarkasme beskrywing. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek multimodale sarkasme-opdekking van 'n nuwe perspektief deur 'n kruismodaal graaf te konstrukteer vir elke voorbeeld om die ironiese verhoudings tussen tekstuele en visuele modaliteite te teken. Spesifieke, ons vind eerste die voorwerpe wat met die beskrywings van die beeld modaliteit gepaar is, en aktiveer die leer van belangrik visuele inligting. Dan, die beskrywings van die voorwerpe word gedien as 'n brig om die belangrikheid van die assosiasie tussen die voorwerpe van die beeld modaliteit en die contextual woorde van teks modaliteit te bepaal, sodat om 'n kruismodaal graf vir elke multimodaal voorbeeld te bou. Ons het ook 'n kruismodaal graaf konvolusionele netwerk ontwerp om sens te maak van die ongeregtigheid verhouding tussen modaliteite vir multimodaal sarkasme-opdekking. Ekstensiewe eksperimentale resultate en in-diepte analisie vertoon dat ons model bereik staat-van-kuns-prestasie in multimodale sarkasme-opdekking.", 'am': 'በብዙ መልዕክቶች በመስመር ላይ በማድረግ የሚጨምረው ህዝብ፣ የቀድሞው የጽሑፍ እና የራእይ መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም ተፈጥሮአል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጽሑፍ እና የራእይ ዓይነት መካከል የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነትን በግልጽ ለመግለጽ እና በመስመር የሚቆጠር የፖለቲካዊ ግንኙነት እና የዞርካዊ ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ ከረኀብ አየር አየር ላይ እናሳይናለን፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ አስቀድመን የምስል መልዕክት የተደራረቡትን አካባቢዎች እናሳውቃለን፣ የሚያስፈልገውን የራእይ መረጃ ማምረጥ እናስችላለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የአካባቢዎቹን ጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል በጥያቄ እና የጽሑፍ መልዕክት መካከል ማኅበራዊ ግንኙነትን ለማረጋገጥ እንደ bridge ይጠቀማል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የክፍለ ሥርዓት ግንኙነት ለብዙዎች አካባቢ ስርዓት ግንኙነት ማሳየት እናስባለን፡፡ ብዙ ፈተና ፍሬዎችን እና የጥልቅ አስተያየት ሞዴሌያችን በብዙ-ሞዴል ሳርካሲም ግዛት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մոլիմոդալ հաղորդագրությունների տեղադրման առցանց աճող բնակչության շնորհիվ վերջերս կատարվել են շատ հետազոտություններ, որոնք օգտագործում են տեքստային և վիզուալ տեղեկատվությունը բազմամոդալ սարկազմի հայտնաբերման համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բազմամոդալ սարկազմի հայտնաբերումը նոր տեսանկյունից, կառուցելով խաչմոդալ գծագիր յուրաքանչյուր օրինակի համար, որպեսզի բացատրականորեն նկարենք հեգնական հարաբերությունները տեքստալ և վիզուալ մոդե Մասնավորապես, մենք առաջին անգամ հայտնաբերում ենք առարկաները, որոնք զույգված են պատկերի մոդելավորության նկարագրությունների հետ, որն օգնում է կարևոր տեսողական ինֆորմացիայի սովորել: Այնուհետև օբյեկտների նկարագրությունները ծառայում են որպես կամուրջ, որպեսզի որոշենք պատկերի մեդիալիության օբյեկտների և տեքստի մեդիալիության կոնտեքստային բառերի միջև կապվածության կարևորությունը, որպեսզի Ավելին, մենք ստեղծում ենք մի խաչմոդալ գծագրի հակառակցող ցանց, որպեսզի իմանանք, թե ինչպես են համապատասխանում բազմամոդալ սարկազմի հայտնաբերման մեթոդները: Ամբողջ փորձարկման արդյունքները և խորը վերլուծությունը ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքներին բազմամոդային սարկազմի հայտնաբերման մեջ:', 'az': 'İnternettə çoxlu modal ismarışları göndərmək üçün daha yüksək məşhurluğu ilə, çoxlu modal sarkasm keşif üçün textual və görsel məlumatlar istifadə edilmişdir. Bu kağızda, yeni bir perspektivdən çoxlu modal sarkasm keşfini incidirik, hər məsəl üçün bir çoxlu modal grafik inşa edirik ki, textual və visual modüllər arasındakı ironik ilişkileri a çıq-aydın çizdirmək üçün. Özellikle, ilk dəfə görüntü modalitatının tanımlamaları ilə birlikdə olan objekləri keşfetirik, möhüm görüntü məlumatlarını öyrənməyə qadir edirik. Sonra, objektlərin tanımlamaları hər çoxlu modal örnek üçün çox modal grafik inşa etmək üçün şəkillərin modaliyyətinin və mətn modaliyyətinin əlaqələrinin çoxluğunu müəyyən etmək üçün köprü kimi işlədilər. Daha sonra, çoxlu modal sarkasm keşfetməsi üçün modüllər arasındakı müəyyən edilmə məlumatını anlamaq üçün çoxlu modal grafik konvolucional a ğı təşkil edirik. Müxtəlif təcrübə sonuçları və derinlik analizi modellərimizin çoxlu modal sarkasm keşfinində müəyyən edilmiş təcrübələrə yetişdirdiyini göstərir.', 'bn': 'অনলাইনে মাল্টিমোডাল বার্তা পোস্ট করার জন্য জনপ্রিয়তা বাড়তে থাকার পরে অনেক সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে বহুমোডাল বিদ্রোহী সনাক্ত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে বহুমোডাল বিদ্রোহী সনাক্ত করি প্রত্যেক উদাহরণের জন্য একটি ক্রস-মোডাল গ্রাফ নির্মাণ করে প্রতিটি উদাহরণের জন্য বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথমে চিত্রের মডেলের বর্ণনা দিয়ে যুক্ত বস্তুগুলো সনাক্ত করি, যা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দৃশ্য তথ্য শিখতে পারে। তারপর বস্তুর বর্ণনা একটি ব্রিজ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হয়, যাতে ছবির মোডেল এবং টেক্সট মোডালের মাধ্যমে যোগাযোগের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয় নির্ধারণ করা হয়, যাতে প্রত্যেক মোডাল এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি ক্রস-মোডাল গ্রাফ নেটওয়ার্ক পরিকল্পনা করেছি যাতে মাল্টিমোডাল বিদ্রোহীদের মধ্যে যে সম্পর্কের ব্যাপারে বুঝতে পার বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল এবং গভীর বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল মাল্টিমোডাল বিদ্রোহ সনাক্তির রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের প্রতি', 'cs': 'S rostoucí popularitou zveřejňování multimodálních zpráv online bylo provedeno mnoho nedávných studií využívajících textové i vizuální informace pro detekci multimodálního sarkasmu. V tomto článku zkoumáme detekci multimodálního sarkasmu z nové perspektivy vytvořením crossmodálního grafu pro každou instanci, který explicitně nakreslí ironické vztahy mezi textovými a vizuálními modalitami. Konkrétně nejprve detekujeme objekty spárované s popisem modality obrazu, což umožňuje naučit se důležitých vizuálních informací. Následně jsou popisy objektů slouženy jako most k určení významu asociace mezi objekty obrazové modality a kontextovými slovy textové modality, aby byl sestaven crossmodální graf pro každou multimodální instanci. Dále navrhujeme intermodální grafovou konvoluční síť, abychom zjistili smysl nesrovnalostních vztahů mezi modalitami pro detekci multimodálního sarkasmu. Rozsáhlé experimentální výsledky a hloubková analýza ukazují, že náš model dosahuje nejmodernějších výkonů v detekci multimodálního sarkasmu.', 'ca': "With the increasing popularity of posting multimodal messages online, many recent studies have been carried out utilizing both textual and visual information for multi-modal sarcasm detection.  En aquest article investigam la detecció del sarcasme multi modal d'una nova perspectiva construint un gràfic transmodal per cada cas per dibuixar explícitament les relacions iròniques entre les modalitats textuals i visuals. Concretament, primer detectem els objectes parellats amb descripcions de la modalitat d'imatge, habilitant l'aprenentatge d'informació visual important. Llavors, les descripcions dels objectes serveixen com un pont per determinar l'importància de l'associació entre els objectes de la modalitat d'imatge i les paraules contextuals de la modalitat de text, per tal de construir un gràfic transmodal per cada cas multi modal. A més, dissenyem una xarxa de convolució de gràfics transmodals per tenir sentit a les relacions incongruents entre les modalitats de detecció del sarcasme multi modal. Els grans resultats experimentals i l'anàlisi en profunditat demostren que el nostre model aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat en la detecció del sarcasme multi modal.", 'bs': 'S povećanjem popularnosti postavljanja multimodalnih poruka na internetu, provedena je mnogo nedavnih ispitivanja koji koriste tekstualne i vizualne informacije za otkrivanje multimodalnih sarkazama. U ovom papiru istražujemo otkrivanje multimodalnog sarkazma iz novog perspektiva, konstruirajući cross-modalni grafik za svaki primjer kako bismo izrazili ironičke odnose između tekstualnih i vizualnih modaliteta. Posebno, prvo otkrivamo objekte povezani sa opisima modaliteta slike, omogućavajući učenje važnih vizualnih informacija. Onda su opisi objekata služeni kao most kako bi utvrdila važnost asocijacije između objekata modaliteta slika i kontekstualne riječi modaliteta teksta, kako bi izgradila cross-modalni grafik za svaku multimodalnu primjeru. Osim toga, mi smislimo konvolucionalnu mrežu preko modalnog grafika kako bi imali smisla o nepravednosti odnosa između modaliteta za multimodalno otkrivanje sarkazma. Eksperimentalni rezultati i duboka analiza pokazuju da naš model postigne postupak stanja umjetnosti u multimodalnom detekciji sarkazma.', 'et': 'Mitmeliigiliste sõnumite internetis postitamise populaarsuse tõttu on mitmeid hiljutisi uuringuid läbi viidud, kasutades multimodaalse sarkasmi tuvastamiseks nii tekstilist kui visuaalset infot. Käesolevas töös uurime multimodaalse sarkasmi avastamist uudsest vaatenurgast, ehitades iga juhtumi jaoks multimodaalse graafiku, et selgesõnaliselt joonistada iroonilisi seoseid teksti ja visuaalsete modaalide vahel. Konkreetselt tuvastame esmalt objektid, mis on seotud pildimeetodi kirjeldustega, võimaldades õppida olulist visuaalset informatsiooni. Seejärel kasutatakse objektide kirjeldusi sillana, et määrata kindlaks pildimodaalsuse objektide ja tekstimodaalsuse kontekstisõnade seose olulisus, et ehitada iga multimodaalse eksemplari jaoks multimodaalne graafik. Lisaks töötame välja transmodaalse graafilise konvolutsioonivõrgu, et mõista mitmeliigilise sarkasmi tuvastamise modaalide vahelisi vastuolusid. Ulatuslikud eksperimentaalsed tulemused ja põhjalikud analüüsid näitavad, et meie mudel saavutab kaasaegse jõudluse multimodaalse sarkasmi tuvastamisel.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe modal mesajlary internede göndermek üçin köp sanly öňki araştyrmalar boldy. Bu kagyzda, we kitap perspektivinden örän modal grafik gurarak, tekstual we görsel modalaryň arasyndaky ironiki baglaýyşlaryny düşündirip barýarys. Adatça, biz ilkinji gezek surat modalitatynyň waspy bilen birleşmiş zady tanyýarys we möhüm görsel maglumaty öwrenmegi mümkin edýäris Soňra, bu zadyň deskripleri görkezilýän modalitet we metin modalitet sözleriniň arasyndaky baglaýyşyň hökmüni takyklamak üçin köprüg bolup geçirilýär. Munuň üçin, multi modal sarkasm tanyşynyň modülleriň arasynda durmadyklaryň habarlaryny düşünmek üçin cross-modal grafik karmaşgalaryň a ňlaşygyny tasarlýarys. Döwletli denetim netijesi we derinlikli analizimiz biziň modelimiz multi modal sarkasm tanyşynda durum taýýarlandygyny görkezýär.', 'fi': 'Multimodaalisten viestien julkaisemisen suosion kasvaessa verkossa on tehty useita viimeaikaisia tutkimuksia, joissa hyödynnetään sekä tekstillistä että visuaalista tietoa multimodaalisen sarkasmin havaitsemiseen. Tässä tutkielmassa tutkimme multimodaalisen sarkasmin havaitsemista uudesta näkökulmasta rakentamalla kullekin tapaukselle multimodaalisen graafin, joka nimenomaisesti piirtää ironisia suhteita tekstien ja visuaalisten modaalien välillä. Tarkemmin sanottuna havaitsemme ensin objektit yhdistettynä kuvamuodon kuvauksiin, mikä mahdollistaa tärkeän visuaalisen tiedon oppimisen. Tämän jälkeen objektien kuvaukset toimivat siltana, jonka avulla voidaan määrittää kuvamodaalisuuden objektien ja tekstimodaalisuuden kontekstuaalisten sanojen välisen yhteyden merkitys, jotta voidaan rakentaa transmodaalinen kaavio kullekin multimodaaliselle instanssille. Lisäksi kehitämme multimodaalisen graafisen konvolutionaalisen verkoston ymmärtämään multimodaalisen sarkasmin havaitsemisen modaalien välisiä ristiriitaisuussuhteita. Laajat kokeelliset tulokset ja syvällinen analyysi osoittavat, että mallimme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn multimodaalisen sarkasmin havaitsemisessa.', 'jv': 'Punika popularno sing gak popularno sing isa gambar akeh modal online, akeh akeh cilabah sing dumadhi iki dadi supoyo nggawe informasi textual lan video kanggo ngerasakno sistem multimodal Nang pepul iki, kéné ujarane resmi ultihan karo perbudhakan anyar modal string" in "context_BAR_stringLink politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mungkin orah, kita ditambah sistem krês-modal sing perusahaan netwisik dadi, dadi wis intakno karo perusahaan karo modalitat kanggo ditambah akeh sarkasm multimodal AllProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'עם הפופולריות הגדולה של פרסום הודעות multi modal באינטרנט, ערכו מחקרים רבים לאחרונה בשימוש גם מידע טקסטלי וגם מידע ויזואלי לגילוי סרקזם multimodal. In this paper, we investigate multi-modal sarcasm detection from a novel perspective by constructing a cross-modal graph for each instance to explicitly draw the ironic relations between textual and visual modalities.  במיוחד, אנו קודם מגלים את החפצים שזווים לתיאורים של מודיאליות התמונה, מאפשרים ללמוד מידע חזותי חשוב. ואז, התיאורים של האובייקטים משמשים כגשר כדי לקבוע את חשיבותו של הקשר בין האובייקטים של מודיאליות התמונה למילים הקונקסטיות של מודיאליות טקסט, כדי לבנות גרף צלב מודיאלי לכל דוגמה מודיאלית. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מתכננים רשת משתנה של גרף דרך-מודל כדי להבין את היחסים הבלתי מתאימים בין מודיאליות לגילוי סרקזם רב-מודל. תוצאות ניסויים רחבות ובניתוח עמוק מראים שהמודל שלנו משיג ביצועים מצויינים בזיהוי סרקזם מוליטלי.', 'sk': 'Z naraščajočo popularnostjo objavljanja multimodalnih sporočil na spletu so bile izvedene številne nedavne študije, ki so uporabljale besedilne in vizualne informacije za multimodalno odkrivanje sarkazma. V prispevku raziskujemo multimodalno odkrivanje sarkazma iz nove perspektive z izdelavo medmodalnega grafa za vsak primer, da izrecno narišemo ironične odnose med besedilnimi in vizualnimi modalinami. Natančneje, najprej zaznamo predmete v zvezi z opisi slikovne modalnosti, kar omogoča učenje pomembnih vizualnih informacij. Nato opisi objektov služijo kot most za ugotavljanje pomena povezave med objekti slikovne modalnosti in kontekstualnimi besedami besedilne modalnosti, da bi za vsak multimodalni primer zgradili medmodalni graf. Poleg tega smo oblikovali medmodalno grafsko konvolucijsko mrežo, da bi razumeli neskladnostne razmerje med modalitvami za multimodalno odkrivanje sarkazma. Obsežni eksperimentalni rezultati in poglobljena analiza kažejo, da naš model dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti pri odkrivanju multimodalnega sarkazma.', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa da ana ƙara da umarin posten manzanni masu multi-multi-mutane a Online, an cika mutane mãsu yawa da aka yi amfani da amfani da amfani da littãfin da gannai wa ganin sarkasm na multi-modal. In a cikin wannan takardan, Munã yin ƙidãya masu sarkasm masu yawa daga wani wuni na node, ana samun wata grafi mai korsa-modal dõmin ya nuna mazaɓa da tarakiki tsakanin littãfi da tsari masu gani. A kan ƙayyade, za'a gane abubuwa da aka haɗa su da sifilafin surar, kuma za'a yi amfani da in karanta maɓallin zane da muhimu. A sa'an nan, za'a yi amfani da misalin abun kamar birnin ya bayyana muhimmin associati a tsakanin abun abubuwa masu tsari na zane da maganar da ke cikin tsarin matsayin, dõmin a ƙiƙira wata grafi mai maras-modal wa misali masu multi-modal. Furan haka, muna ƙayyade wata tarayya mai kamfata na fassarar-modal dõmin mu fahimta danganta da ba'a koma ba a tsakanin taƙaitãwa a tsakanin tamkar sarki masu yawa. Ana nuna matsalan jarrabai masu ƙaranci da Ana cikin-depth, misalinmu yana sãmun muhimmin-muhimmin-sanannin da za'a gane sarcasm masu yawa.", 'bo': 'འཕྲིན་དོན་སྣ་མང་ཆེ་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད་པ་དང་གསར་བརྗོད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐོང་སྣང་བ་དང་མཐོང འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་ལས་མཐོང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྣམ་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ཁྱད་པར་ན། ང་ཚོས་དངོས་པོ་རྣམས་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པའི་དངོས་པོ་རྟོགས དེ་ནས་དངོས་པོ་ཚོའི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་འདི་ཕན་རིས་སྤྱད་ནས་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་རྣམ་པ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་གལ་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་གཏོང་བ་དང་། ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་མཐོང་བའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བའི་མཐུད་ལམ་ཞིག་བཟོ་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། Extensive experimental results and in-depth analysis show that our model achieves state-of-the-art performance in multi modal sarcasm detection.'}
{'en': 'Adapting Coreference Resolution Models through Active Learning', 'ar': 'الضبط الدقيق القابل للتكوين من أجل النقل عبر اللغات', 'pt': 'Ajuste fino composable esparso para transferência entre idiomas', 'es': 'Ajuste fino componible disperso para la transferencia multilingüe', 'fr': 'Réglage fin Composable Sparse pour le transfert multilingue', 'ja': 'クロスリンガル転送のための構成可能なまばらな微調整', 'zh': '跨语传输者合疏微', 'ru': 'Композиционная разреженная тонкая настройка для кросс-лингвальной передачи', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल स्थानांतरण के लिए कंपोजेबल विरल फाइन-ट्यूनिंग', 'ga': "Mionchoigeartú In-chomhdhéanta d'Aistriú Trastheangach", 'el': 'Σύνθετη αραιή ρύθμιση λεπτού συντονισμού για τη διασυνοριακή μεταφορά', 'hu': 'Komponálható ritka finomhangolás a nyelvközi transzferhez', 'ka': 'კონფიგური გადატანისთვის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაცია', 'lt': 'Sudėtinis atsarginis koregavimas tarpkalbiniam perdavimui', 'it': 'Fine-tuning componibile sparso per trasferimento cross-lingual', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'Қосылық тілікті тасымалдау үшін құрамындағы кеңіл түзету', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ഗല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സ്പേഴ്സില്\u200d നല്ല ട്യൂണിങ്ങ് ചേര്\u200dക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Baik Ganti Komposible untuk Pemindahan Selasa-Lingua', 'mt': 'Aġġustament Finali Sperzjali Kompożibbli għat-Trasferiment Translingwali', 'no': 'Kombinert mellomromsetjing for krysslingsoverføring', 'pl': 'Kompozytowe rzadkie dostrojenie do transferu między językami', 'ro': 'Tuning fin compozibil spart pentru transfer translingvistic', 'mn': 'Төрсөн хэлбэрийн дамжуулалтын төлөвлөгөө', 'sr': 'Kombinativna sparse fina prilagodba za preko-lingualnu prevozu', 'so': 'Iswidishka Fine-Tuning', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් ලින්ගුල් ස්ථානය සඳහා සම්පූර්ණ ස්පාර්ස් හොඳ සංවිධානය', 'sv': 'Komposterbar sparsam finjustering för tvärspråklig överföring', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'க்ராஸ்- கோட்டு மாற்றுவதற்கு ஒப்பிடும் செல்லும் வினாட்டு நன்றாக- பயிற்சி', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Композируема рядка фина настройка за междуезиков трансфер', 'da': 'Komponerbar sparsom finjustering til tværsproglig overførsel', 'nl': 'Composable Sparse Fine-Tuning voor Cross-Lingual Transfer', 'hr': 'Kombinativna sparse fina prilagodba za preko-lingualnu prijenos', 'id': 'Penyesuaian Tampan Terkomposibel untuk Transfer Selasa Lingua', 'fa': 'تغییرات پاکیزه\u200cای برای انتقال متصل زبان', 'de': 'Composable Sparse Fine-Tuning für den sprachübergreifenden Transfer', 'sw': 'Kihispania kinachofanana', 'ko': '다중 언어 전송에 사용되는 조합 희소 조정', 'tr': 'Hatlary Çapraz Taýýarlamak üçin Gatlaýyn Gaýd-Taýýarlama', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i shpejtë i kompozueshëm për transferimin ndërgjuhësor', 'af': 'Komposibel Spasse Fine- Tuning vir Kruis- Linguaal Oordrag', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'Ă‡É™rz Dil Transferi Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n BirlÉ™ÅŸdirilÉ™n Sparse Ä°yi-Tuning', 'bn': 'ক্রস- লিঙ্গুয়াল ট্রান্সফারের জন্য সুন্দর স্পেস', 'ca': 'Un ajustament ràpid compososable per a la transferència translíngua', 'bs': 'Kombinativna sparse fina prilagodba za preko-lingualnu prijenos', 'cs': 'Kompozitní řídké jemné ladění pro crosslinguální přenos', 'et': 'Komponeeritav harv peen häälestamine keeleülese ülekande jaoks', 'fi': 'Säveltävä harva hienosäätö kielienvälistä siirtoa varten', 'jv': 'Compsable SparsFine-Tuning kanggo', 'sk': 'Komponentna redka fina nastavitev za medjezikovni prenos', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'התאמה מיוחדת מורכבת עבור העברה לינגולית', 'bo': 'མཉམ་སྦྲགས་པའི་བར་སྟོང་དང་ཆུ་ཚོད་ལྡན་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Neural coreference resolution models trained on one dataset may not transfer to new low resource domains Active learning mitigates this problem by sampling a small subset of data for annotators to label While active learning is well defined for classification tasks its application to coreference resolution is neither well defined nor fully understood This paper explores how to actively label coreference examining sources of model uncertainty and document reading costs We compare uncertainty sampling strategies and their advantages through thorough error analysis In both synthetic and human experiments labeling spans within the same document is more effective than annotating spans across documents The findings contribute to a more realistic development of coreference resolution models', 'ar': 'أصبح الضبط الدقيق لمجموعة كاملة من المعلمات لنموذج كبير تم اختباره مسبقًا هو النهج السائد لنقل التعلم. لزيادة كفاءتها ومنع النسيان والتداخل الكارثي ، تم تطوير تقنيات مثل المحولات والضبط الدقيق المتناثر. المحولات هي وحدات معيارية ، حيث يمكن دمجها لتكييف نموذج مع جوانب مختلفة من المعرفة (على سبيل المثال ، لغة مخصصة و / أو محولات المهام). يعد الضبط الدقيق المتناثر معبرًا ، حيث يتحكم في سلوك جميع مكونات النموذج. في هذا العمل ، نقدم طريقة ضبط جديدة مع كلتا الخاصيتين المرغوب فيهما. على وجه الخصوص ، نتعلم أقنعة متفرقة وذات قيمة حقيقية بناءً على متغير بسيط من فرضية تذاكر اليانصيب. يتم الحصول على الأقنعة الخاصة بالمهام من البيانات المشروحة في لغة المصدر ، والأقنعة الخاصة باللغة من نمذجة اللغة المقنعة في اللغة المستهدفة. يمكن بعد ذلك تكوين كل من هذه الأقنعة مع النموذج الذي تم اختباره مسبقًا. على عكس الضبط الدقيق المستند إلى المحول ، فإن هذه الطريقة لا تزيد من عدد المعلمات في وقت الاستدلال ولا تغير بنية النموذج الأصلي. والأهم من ذلك ، أنه يتفوق على المحولات في النقل عبر اللغات بدون طلقة بهامش كبير في سلسلة من المعايير متعددة اللغات ، بما في ذلك التبعيات العالمية و MasakhaNER و AmericasNLI.\nبناءً على تحليل متعمق ، وجدنا أيضًا أن التباين ضروري لمنع كل من 1) التداخل بين الضبط الدقيق الذي سيتم تكوينه و 2) التجهيز الزائد. نقوم بإصدار الكود والنماذج في', 'pt': 'O ajuste fino de todo o conjunto de parâmetros de um grande modelo pré-treinado tornou-se a abordagem principal para o aprendizado de transferência. Para aumentar sua eficiência e evitar esquecimentos e interferências catastróficas, técnicas como adaptadores e ajustes finos esparsos foram desenvolvidos. Os adaptadores são modulares, pois podem ser combinados para adaptar um modelo a diferentes facetas do conhecimento (por exemplo, linguagem dedicada e/ou adaptadores de tarefa). O ajuste fino esparso é expressivo, pois controla o comportamento de todos os componentes do modelo. Neste trabalho, apresentamos um novo método de ajuste fino com essas duas propriedades desejáveis. Em particular, aprendemos máscaras esparsas e de valor real com base em uma variante simples da Hipótese do Bilhete de Loteria. Máscaras específicas de tarefa são obtidas de dados anotados em um idioma de origem e máscaras específicas de idioma de modelagem de idioma mascarado em um idioma de destino. Ambas as máscaras podem então ser compostas com o modelo pré-treinado. Ao contrário do ajuste fino baseado em adaptador, esse método não aumenta o número de parâmetros no momento da inferência nem altera a arquitetura do modelo original. Mais importante ainda, ele supera os adaptadores em transferências multilíngues de disparo zero por uma grande margem em uma série de benchmarks multilíngues, incluindo Dependências Universais, MasakhaNER e AmericasNLI.\nCom base em uma análise aprofundada, também descobrimos que a esparsidade é crucial para evitar 1) interferência entre os ajustes finos a serem compostos e 2) overfitting. Liberamos o código e os modelos em', 'fr': "Le réglage fin de l'ensemble des paramètres d'un grand modèle préentraîné est devenu l'approche courante de l'apprentissage par transfert. Pour augmenter son efficacité et éviter les oublis et les interférences catastrophiques, des techniques telles que les adaptateurs et le réglage fin ont été développées. Les adaptateurs sont modulaires, car ils peuvent être combinés pour adapter un modèle à différentes facettes de la connaissance (par exemple, un langage dédié et/ou des adaptateurs de tâches). Le réglage fin est expressif, car il contrôle le comportement de tous les composants du modèle. Dans ce travail, nous introduisons une nouvelle méthode de réglage fin avec ces deux propriétés souhaitables. En particulier, nous apprenons des masques clairsemés à valeur réelle basés sur une variante simple de l'hypothèse du billet de loterie. Les masques spécifiques aux tâches sont obtenus à partir de données annotées dans une langue source, et des masques spécifiques à une langue à partir de la modélisation de langage masqué dans une langue cible. Ces deux masques peuvent ensuite être composés avec le modèle préentraîné. Contrairement au réglage fin basé sur une carte, cette méthode n'augmente pas le nombre de paramètres au moment de l'inférence et ne modifie pas l'architecture du modèle d'origine. Plus important encore, il surpasse de loin les adaptateurs en matière de transfert multilingue zero-shot dans une série de tests de référence multilingues, y compris Universal Dependencies, MasaKhaner et AmericasNLI. \nSur la base d'une analyse approfondie, nous trouvons également que la dispersion est cruciale pour empêcher à la fois 1) les interférences entre les réglages fins à composer et 2) le surajustement. Nous publions le code et les modèles sur", 'es': 'El ajuste de todo el conjunto de parámetros de un gran modelo preentrenado se ha convertido en el enfoque principal para el aprendizaje por transferencia. Para aumentar su eficiencia y evitar el olvido catastrófico y la interferencia, se han desarrollado técnicas como adaptadores y ajustes finos dispersos. Los adaptadores son modulares, ya que se pueden combinar para adaptar un modelo a las diferentes facetas del conocimiento (por ejemplo, adaptadores de idiomas o tareas dedicados). El ajuste fino escaso es expresivo, ya que controla el comportamiento de todos los componentes del modelo. En este trabajo, presentamos un nuevo método de ajuste con estas dos propiedades deseables. En particular, aprendemos máscaras escasas y de valor real basadas en una variante simple de la hipótesis del billete de lotería. Las máscaras específicas de tareas se obtienen a partir de datos anotados en un idioma de origen y máscaras específicas del idioma del modelado de lenguaje enmascarado en un idioma de destino. Ambas máscaras se pueden componer con el modelo previamente entrenado. A diferencia del ajuste fino basado en adaptadores, este método no aumenta el número de parámetros en el momento de la inferencia ni altera la arquitectura del modelo original. Y lo que es más importante, supera a los adaptadores en la transferencia interlingüística cero por un amplio margen en una serie de puntos de referencia multilingües, incluidos Universal Dependencies, MasakHaner y AmericasNLI. \nBasado en un análisis en profundidad, también encontramos que la dispersión es crucial para evitar tanto 1) la interferencia entre los ajustes finos que se van a componer como 2) el sobreajuste. Publicamos el código y los modelos en', 'ja': '大規模な事前訓練されたモデルのパラメータのセット全体を微調整することは、転送学習の主流のアプローチとなっている。 その効率を高め、壊滅的な忘れや干渉を防ぐために、アダプタやまばらな微調整などの技術が開発されています。 アダプタは、異なる側面の知識（例えば、専用言語および／またはタスクアダプタ）に向けてモデルを適応させるために組み合わせることができるため、モジュール式である。 まばらな微調整は、すべてのモデルコンポーネントの挙動を制御するため、表現力があります。 本作では、これらの望ましい特性の両方を備えた新しい微調整方法を紹介します。 特に、宝くじ仮説の単純なバリエーションに基づいて、まばらな実価値のあるマスクを学びます。 タスク固有のマスクは、ソース言語の注釈付きデータから取得され、言語固有のマスクは、ターゲット言語のマスク言語モデリングから取得されます。 これらのマスクの両方は、事前に訓練されたモデルで構成することができます。 アダプタベースの微調整とは異なり、この方法は推論時間におけるパラメータの数を増やすことも、元のモデルアーキテクチャを変更することもありません。 最も重要なのは、Universal Dependencies、MasakhaNER、AmericasNLIなどの一連の多言語ベンチマークで、ゼロショットのクロスリンガル転送でアダプターを大幅に上回るパフォーマンスを発揮することです。 \nさらに、詳細な分析に基づいて、1 ）構成される微調整と2 ）オーバーフィッティングの間の干渉の両方を防ぐためには、希少性が重要であることがわかります。 コードとモデルは次の場所でリリースします', 'zh': '微调大预练模样的全参数集已成为迁徙学习的主流。 为提高效率防灾难性扰,已发适配器疏微。 适配器者,模块化也,合而(之,以言语/任适配器)。 疏微有表现力,所以制形组件也。 于此一新,有此二理。 特以彩票假说之简变体学疏者,真价面具也。 特定于事者掩码取之于言批注数,特定于言者掩码得之于言建模。 然后二掩码皆可以预练模形。 与适配器之微调不同,此术既不加参数数,亦不能改始体系结构。 其最要者,其在列多语言基准测试(包括通用依赖性,MasakhaNER与AmericasNLI)中,于零次跨语转移者大优于适配器。 \n深入之论,疏性1)防,干2)过拟合至要。 发代码模形', 'hi': 'एक बड़े pretrained मॉडल के मापदंडों के पूरे सेट को ठीक ट्यूनिंग स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए मुख्यधारा का दृष्टिकोण बन गया है। इसकी दक्षता बढ़ाने और विनाशकारी भूलने और हस्तक्षेप को रोकने के लिए, एडेप्टर और विरल ठीक ट्यूनिंग जैसी तकनीकों को विकसित किया गया है। एडेप्टर मॉड्यूलर हैं, क्योंकि उन्हें ज्ञान के विभिन्न पहलुओं (जैसे, समर्पित भाषा और / या कार्य एडाप्टर) की ओर एक मॉडल को अनुकूलित करने के लिए जोड़ा जा सकता है। विरल फाइन-ट्यूनिंग अभिव्यंजक है, क्योंकि यह सभी मॉडल घटकों के व्यवहार को नियंत्रित करता है। इस काम में, हम इन दोनों वांछनीय गुणों के साथ एक नई ठीक-ट्यूनिंग विधि पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम लॉटरी टिकट परिकल्पना के एक सरल संस्करण के आधार पर विरल, वास्तविक मूल्यवान मास्क सीखते हैं। कार्य-विशिष्ट मास्क एक स्रोत भाषा में एनोटेट किए गए डेटा से प्राप्त किए जाते हैं, और लक्ष्य भाषा में नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडलिंग से भाषा-विशिष्ट मास्क प्राप्त किए जाते हैं। इन दोनों मुखौटों को तब प्रीट्रेन्ड मॉडल के साथ बनाया जा सकता है। एडाप्टर-आधारित फाइन-ट्यूनिंग के विपरीत, यह विधि न तो अनुमान समय पर पैरामीटर की संख्या बढ़ाती है और न ही मूल मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर को बदलती है। सबसे महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि यह यूनिवर्सल डिपेंडेंसीज, मसाखनेर और अमेरिकाएसएनएलआई सहित बहुभाषी बेंचमार्क की एक श्रृंखला में एक बड़े मार्जिन से शून्य-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर में एडाप्टर को मात देता है। \nएक गहन विश्लेषण के आधार पर, हम यह भी पाते हैं कि स्पार्सिटी दोनों को रोकने के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है 1) ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के बीच हस्तक्षेप और 2) ओवरफिटिंग। हम पर कोड और मॉडल जारी', 'ru': 'Точная настройка всего набора параметров большой предварительно обученной модели стала основным подходом к трансферному обучению. Для повышения его эффективности и предотвращения катастрофического забывания и помех были разработаны такие методы, как адаптеры и редкая тонкая настройка. Адаптеры являются модульными, поскольку они могут быть объединены для адаптации модели к различным аспектам знаний (например, адаптеры выделенного языка и/или задач). Редкая точная настройка является выразительной, поскольку она контролирует поведение всех компонентов модели. В этой работе мы вводим новый метод тонкой настройки с обоими этими желательными свойствами. В частности, мы изучаем редкие, реально ценные маски на основе простого варианта гипотезы лотерейных билетов. Маски, относящиеся к задаче, получаются из аннотированных данных на исходном языке, а маски, относящиеся к языку, - из моделирования маскированного языка на целевом языке. Обе эти маски затем могут быть составлены с предварительно обученной моделью. В отличие от тонкой настройки на основе адаптера, этот метод не увеличивает количество параметров во время вывода и не изменяет исходную архитектуру модели. Самое главное, он превосходит адаптеры при кросс-лингвистической передаче с нулевым выстрелом по большому запасу в серии многоязычных критериев, включая универсальные зависимости, MasakhaNER и AmericasNLI. \nОсновываясь на углубленном анализе, мы дополнительно обнаруживаем, что редкость имеет решающее значение для предотвращения как 1) помех между точной настройкой, которая должна быть составлена, так и 2) переобучения. Мы выпускаем код и модели на', 'ga': "Is é an cur chuige príomhshrutha d'fhoghlaim aistrithe anois í mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar shraith iomlán na bparaiméadar de mhúnla mór réamhoilte. Chun a éifeachtúlacht a mhéadú agus dearmad tubaisteach agus cur isteach a chosc, forbraíodh teicnící cosúil le cuibheoirí agus mionchoigeartú. Is modúlach iad na cuibheoirí, mar is féidir iad a chomhcheangal chun samhail a chur in oiriúint do ghnéithe éagsúla eolais (m.sh. oiriúntóirí tiomnaithe teanga agus/nó tasc). Tá mionchoigeartú léiritheach, toisc go rialaíonn sé iompar gach comhpháirte sa tsamhail. San obair seo, tugaimid isteach modh nua mionchoigeartaithe a bhfuil an dá airí inmhianaithe seo aige. Go háirithe, foghlaimímid maisc tanaí fíorluacha bunaithe ar leagan simplí de Hipitéis Ticéad Crannchuir. Faightear maisc a bhaineann go sonrach le tascanna ó shonraí anótáilte i dteanga foinseach, agus maisc a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga ó shamhaltú teanga faoi cheilt sa sprioctheanga. Is féidir an dá masc seo a chomhdhéanamh ansin leis an múnla réamhoilte. Murab ionann agus mionchoigeartú atá bunaithe ar oiriúntóirí, ní mhéadaíonn an modh seo líon na bparaiméadar ag am tátail ná ní athraíonn sé ailtireacht na samhla bunaidh. Níos tábhachtaí fós, sáraíonn sé oiriúntóirí in aistrithe trasteangacha náid-lámhaigh le corrlach mór i sraith tagarmharcanna ilteangacha, lena n-áirítear Spleáchas Uilíoch, MasakhaNER, agus AmericasNLI.\nBunaithe ar anailís dhomhain, feicimid chomh maith go bhfuil teimhneacht ríthábhachtach chun an dá rud a chosc 1) trasnaíocht idir na mionchoigeartuithe atá le déanamh agus 2) rófheisteas. Scaoilimid an cód agus samhlacha ag", 'ka': 'დიდი მოდელის პარამეტრების ყველა კონფიგურაცია შესაძლებელია, რომელიც გადასწავლისთვის სამუშაო პროგრამეტრები გახდა. რომელიც მისი ეფექტიურობა და დახმარება კატაროტური დახსოვრება და ინტერფერენცია, განვითარებულია ტექნიკები, როგორც აპეტრუტერები და დახმარებული კონტუნ აეპორტები მოდულია, რადგან ისინი შეიძლება შეიძლება მოდულიან, რომ მოდულის აეპორტირება განსხვავებული მეცნიერების ფართობისთვის (მაგალითად, განსაზღვრებული ენაა და/ან და პარამეტრის კონფიგურაცია ექსპექსიურია, როგორც ის კონტროლურებს ყველა მოდელური კონპონენტების ქცევის. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი კონფიგურაციის მეთოდის გადავიყენებთ ორივე უნდა შესაძლებელი მნიშვნელობით. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ვისწავლით წარმოდგენი, რეალურად მნიშვნელოვანი მასკები, რომლებიც ლოტერიის ტიკეტის ჰიპოტესის განსაკუთრებულია. პარამეტრების განსაზღვრებული მაქსები მიიღება მონიტორებული მონაცემებისგან მხოლოდ ენაში, და ენათის განსაზღვრებული მაქსების მაქსების მაქსების მაქსების მაქსების მაქსები ორივე მასკები შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიყვანოთ მოდელზე. აპეპტერთან დაკავშირებული კონფიგურაციის განსხვავებაზე, ეს პროცემი არ გამრავლებს პარამეტრების რაოდენობა ინფრენციის დროში და არ შეცვლებს ორიგინალური მოდელურ ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანია, ეს აპეტრუტები ნულ-სტარული კრესი ენგუფიკალური ტრანსტრინციაში უფრო დიდი მარტინციაში მრავალური ბენქმარკების სერიოში, რომლებიც უნივერსალური განსაცემებები,', 'el': 'Η τελειοποίηση ολόκληρου του συνόλου παραμέτρων ενός μεγάλου προ-εκπαιδευμένου μοντέλου έχει γίνει η κύρια προσέγγιση για τη μάθηση μεταφοράς. Για να αυξηθεί η αποτελεσματικότητά του και να αποφευχθεί η καταστροφική λησμονή και παρέμβαση, έχουν αναπτυχθεί τεχνικές όπως προσαρμογείς και αραιής συντονισμός. Οι προσαρμογείς είναι αρθρωτοί, καθώς μπορούν να συνδυαστούν για να προσαρμόσουν ένα μοντέλο σε διαφορετικές πτυχές της γνώσης (π.χ. ειδικοί προσαρμογείς γλώσσας ή/και εργασιών). Η λεπτή ρύθμιση είναι εκφραστική, καθώς ελέγχει τη συμπεριφορά όλων των εξαρτημάτων του μοντέλου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια νέα μέθοδο συντονισμού με και τις δύο αυτές επιθυμητές ιδιότητες. Ειδικότερα, μαθαίνουμε σπάνιες μάσκες πραγματικής αξίας βασισμένες σε μια απλή παραλλαγή της υπόθεσης λαχειοφόρων εισιτηρίων. Οι μάσκες συγκεκριμένων εργασιών λαμβάνονται από σχολιασμένα δεδομένα σε μια γλώσσα προέλευσης και οι μάσκες συγκεκριμένης γλώσσας από μοντελοποίηση μασκών σε μια γλώσσα προορισμού. Και οι δύο αυτές μάσκες μπορούν στη συνέχεια να συνθεθούν με το προκαθορισμένο μοντέλο. Σε αντίθεση με τον προσαρμογέα, η μέθοδος αυτή δεν αυξάνει τον αριθμό των παραμέτρων κατά το χρόνο συμπερασμάτων ούτε αλλάζει την αρχική αρχιτεκτονική του μοντέλου. Το σημαντικότερο είναι ότι ξεπερνά τους προσαρμογείς στη διασυνοριακή μεταφορά μηδενικού πυροβολισμού κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο σε μια σειρά πολύγλωσσων κριτηρίων αναφοράς, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των καθολικών εξαρτήσεων, του MasakhaNER και του AmericasNLI.', 'hu': 'A transzfertanulás általános megközelítésévé vált egy nagy előképzett modell paramétereinek finomhangolása. Hatékonyságának növelése és a katasztrofális felejtés és interferencia megelőzése érdekében olyan technikákat fejlesztettek ki, mint az adapterek és a ritka finomhangolás. Az adapterek modulárisak, mivel kombinálhatók, hogy a modellt a tudás különböző aspektusaihoz igazítsák (pl. dedikált nyelvi és/vagy feladatadapterekhez). A ritka finomhangolás kifejező, mivel az irányítja az összes modellkomponens viselkedését. Ebben a munkában egy új finomhangolási módszert vezetünk be mindkét kívánatos tulajdonsággal. Különösen ritka, valódi értékű maszkokat tanulunk a Lottószelvény hipotézis egyszerű változata alapján. A feladat-specifikus maszkok a forrásnyelven lévő jegyzetelt adatokból, valamint a célnyelven lévő maszkok nyelvspecifikus maszkjaiból származnak. Ezt követően mindkét maszk összeállítható az előkészített modell segítségével. Az adapter alapú finomhangolással ellentétben ez a módszer nem növeli a paraméterek számát a következtetési időben, és nem változtatja meg az eredeti modell architektúráját. A legfontosabb, hogy az adaptereket nagy mértékben felülmúlja a nulla-shot keresztnyelvű transzfer terén, többnyelvű referenciaértékek sorozatában, beleértve az univerzális függőségeket, a MasakhaNER-t és az AmericasNLI-t.', 'it': "La messa a punto dell'intero set di parametri di un modello pretrained di grandi dimensioni è diventata l'approccio principale per l'apprendimento del trasferimento. Per aumentarne l'efficienza e prevenire errori catastrofici e interferenze, sono state sviluppate tecniche come adattatori e scarsa messa a punto. Gli adattatori sono modulari, in quanto possono essere combinati per adattare un modello a diversi aspetti della conoscenza (ad esempio, adattatori dedicati al linguaggio e/o al compito). La scarsa messa a punto è espressiva, in quanto controlla il comportamento di tutti i componenti del modello. In questo lavoro, introduciamo un nuovo metodo di messa a punto con entrambe queste proprietà desiderabili. In particolare, impariamo maschere sparse e di valore reale basate su una semplice variante dell'ipotesi del biglietto della lotteria. Le maschere specifiche delle attività sono ottenute da dati annotati in una lingua di origine e maschere specifiche della lingua dalla modellazione del linguaggio mascherato in una lingua di destinazione. Entrambe queste maschere possono quindi essere composte con il modello pretrained. A differenza del fine tuning basato su adattatore, questo metodo non aumenta il numero di parametri al momento dell'inferenza né altera l'architettura del modello originale. Ancora più importante, supera gli adattatori in trasferimento cross-lingual zero-shot di un ampio margine in una serie di benchmark multilingue, tra cui Universal Dependences, MasakhaNER e AmericasNLI.", 'lt': 'Fine-tuning the entire set of parameters of a large pretrained model has become the mainstream approach for transfer learning.  To increase its efficiency and prevent catastrophic forgetting and interference, techniques like adapters and sparse fine-tuning have been developed.  Adaptatoriai yra moduliniai, nes juos galima derinti, kad modelis būtų pritaikytas prie skirtingų žinių aspektų (pvz., specialių kalbų ir (arba) užduočių adaptorių). Mažas koregavimas yra išraiškas, nes jis kontroliuoja visų modelio komponentų elgesį. In this work, we introduce a new fine-tuning method with both these desirable properties.  In particular, we learn sparse, real-valued masks based on a simple variant of the Lottery Ticket Hypothesis.  Konkrečios užduoties kaukės gaunamos iš užrašytų duomenų šaltinio kalba ir konkrečios kalbos kaukės iš paslėptos kalbos modeliavimo tiksline kalba. Tada abi šios kaukės gali būti sudarytos iš išankstinio mokymo modelio. Unlike adapter-based fine-tuning, this method neither increases the number of parameters at inference time nor alters the original model architecture.  Most importantly, it outperforms adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer by a large margin in a series of multilingual benchmarks, including Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, and AmericasNLI.', 'mk': 'Уредувањето на целиот сет параметри на големиот предобучен модел стана главен пристап за трансферентно учење. To increase its efficiency and prevent catastrophic forgetting and interference, techniques like adapters and sparse fine-tuning have been developed.  Adapters are modular, as they can be combined to adapt a model towards different facets of knowledge (e.g., dedicated language and/or task adapters).  Побрзо финетирање е експресивно, бидејќи го контролира однесувањето на сите моделни компоненти. In this work, we introduce a new fine-tuning method with both these desirable properties.  In particular, we learn sparse, real-valued masks based on a simple variant of the Lottery Ticket Hypothesis.  Маски специфични за задачите се добиваат од анотирани податоци на изворен јазик, и маски специфични за јазик од моделирање на маскиран јазик на метен јазик. Двете маски можат да бидат составени со предобучениот модел. Unlike adapter-based fine-tuning, this method neither increases the number of parameters at inference time nor alters the original model architecture.  Најважно е, тој ги надминува адаптерите во нулта-снимка крстојазичен трансфер со голема маргина во серија мултијазични референтни значки, вклучувајќи ги универзалните зависности, Масакханер и АмериканскиNLI.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വലിയ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച മോഡലിന്റെ മുഴുവന്\u200d പരാമീറ്ററുകളുടെ മുഴുവന്\u200d സജ്ജീകരിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു അതിന്റെ സാധ്യത വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും വിപത്ത് മറക്കുന്നതും തടസ്സപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും വേണ്ടിയാണ്, ആഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200dമാരെപ് അഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200d മോഡിയലാണ്, ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത മുഖങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടാന്\u200d സാധിക എല്ലാ മോഡല്\u200d ഘടകങ്ങളുടെയും സ്വഭാവം നിയന്ത്രിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സ്പേഴ്സിന്റെ സുന്ദരന്മാരുടെ സ്വഭാവം  In this work, we introduce a new fine-tuning method with both these desirable properties.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമുക്ക് സ്പാസ്, യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിലയുള്ള മുഖം പഠിക്കുന്നു. ലോട്ടറി ടിക്കറ്റി ഹൈപ്പോട്ടെസിസിന ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും മുഖം മൂടിയ ഭാഷ മോഡലിങില്\u200d നിന്നും ജോലി പ്രത്യേക മുഖം ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഈ മുഖം രണ്ടുപേര്\u200dക്കും പ്രത്യേകിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും. അഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സുന്ദരിയുടെ സംഘത്തെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായി ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d അപരാമീറ്റര്\u200d സമയത്തില്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുകയ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്, അത് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി വെടിവെക്കപ്പെടുന്നവരെ പൂജ്യ ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും മാറ്റുന്നത് ഒരു വലിയ മാര്\u200dഗിന്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതാണ്. ഒരു കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പല ഭാഷ മ', 'ms': 'Fine-tuning the entire set of parameters of a large pretrained model has become the mainstream approach for transfer learning.  Untuk meningkatkan efisiensinya dan mencegah lupaan dan gangguan bencana, teknik seperti penyesuaian dan penyesuaian ringan telah dikembangkan. Adapters are modular, as they can be combined to adapt a model towards different facets of knowledge (e.g., dedicated language and/or task adapters).  Sparse fine-tuning is expressive, as it controls the behavior of all model components.  Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah penyesuaian baru dengan kedua-dua ciri-ciri yang diinginkan. Terutama, kita belajar topeng yang sedikit, bernilai sebenar berdasarkan variasi sederhana hipotesis Tiket Loteri. Topeng-khusus tugas diperoleh dari data yang dicatat dalam bahasa sumber, dan topeng-khusus bahasa dari pemodelan bahasa bertopeng dalam bahasa sasaran. Both these masks can then be composed with the pretrained model.  Tidak seperti penyesuaian terbasis penyesuaian, kaedah ini tidak meningkatkan bilangan parameter pada masa kesimpulan atau mengubah arkitektur model asal. Yang paling penting, ia melebihi penyesuaian dalam pemindahan bahasa-saling 0-shot dengan margin besar dalam siri tanda referensi berbilang bahasa, termasuk Dependencies Universal, MasakhaNER, dan AmerikasNLI.', 'mt': 'L-irfinar tas-sett sħiħ ta’ parametri ta’ mudell kbir imħarreġ minn qabel sar l-approċċ ewlieni għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment. To increase its efficiency and prevent catastrophic forgetting and interference, techniques like adapters and sparse fine-tuning have been developed.  L-adattaturi huma modulari, peress li jistgħu jiġu kkombinati biex jadattaw mudell lejn aspetti differenti tal-g ħarfien (pereżempju, adattaturi dedikati tal-lingwa u/jew tal-kompiti). L-irfinar żgħir huwa espressiv, peress li jikkontrolla l-imġiba tal-komponenti kollha tal-mudell. F’dan ix-xogħol, a ħna nintroduċu metodu ġdid ta’ rfinar b’dawn iż-żewġ karatteristiċi mixtieqa. B’mod partikolari, nitgħallmu maskri rari, ta’ valur reali bbażati fuq varjant sempliċi tal-Ipoteżi tal-Karta tal-Lotterija. Il-maskri speċifiċi għall-kompiti jinkisbu minn dejta annotata f’lingwa tas-sors, u maskri speċifiċi għall-lingwa mill-mudellar tal-lingwa maskrata f’lingwa fil-mira. Iż-żewġ maskri jistgħu mbagħad ikunu komposti mal-mudell imħarreġ minn qabel. Għall-kuntrarju tal-aġġustament fin ibbażat fuq l-adapter, dan il-metodu la jżid in-numru ta’ parametri fil-ħin tal-inferenza u lanqas ma jbiddel l-arkitettura tal-mudell oriġinali. Most importantly, it outperforms adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer by a large margin in a series of multilingual benchmarks, including Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, and AmericasNLI.', 'mn': 'Томоохон загварын бүх параметрлүүдийг тодорхойлох нь суралцах сургалтын гол арга зам болсон. Эцсийн үр дүнг нэмэгдүүлэх, гамшгийг мартаж, холбогдохын тулд, адаптер болон сайхан шийдвэрлэх техникууд хөгжигдсэн. Адаптерууд нь модуль юм. Учир нь эдгээр загварыг мэдлэгийн өөр хэлбэртэй адаптерүүд рүү зэрэгцүүлэхэд нийлүүлж болно. Бүх загварын компонентийн дасгал хөдөлгөөнийг удирдаж байгаа учраас загварын тохиромжтой тохиромжтой. Энэ ажлын тулд бид хоёр хүсэл чадвартай хоёулаа шинэ сайжруулах аргыг танилцуулдаг. Ялангуяа бид Лотерийн Цагийн Хипотезийн энгийн хувилбар дээр жинхэнэ үнэ цэнэтэй газрын зураг суралцаж байна. Тапсыг тодорхой газрын зураг эх хэл дээр анзаарсан мэдээллээс, хэл тодорхой газрын зураг зорилготой хэл дээр дүрслэгдсэн зураг авдаг. Эдгээр газрын зураг хоёуланг нь цэвэрхэн загвартай бий болгож болно. Адптор дээр суурилсан тохиромжтой тохиромжтой ялгаатай, энэ арга нь халдварын цаг хугацаанд параметр тохиромжтой, бас эхний загварын архитектурыг өөрчилж чадахгүй. Хамгийн чухал нь энэ нь хэлний олон хэлний салбаруудын тоо хэлбэрээр тэгш хэлний шилжүүлэлтийн адаптерүүдийг тэгш хэлбэрээр дамжуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Ajustarea fină a întregului set de parametri ai unui model de dimensiuni mari pre-instruite a devenit abordarea principală pentru învățarea transferului. Pentru a crește eficiența și pentru a preveni uitarea catastrofală și interferențele, au fost dezvoltate tehnici precum adaptoarele și reglarea fină rară. Adaptoarele sunt modulare, deoarece pot fi combinate pentru a adapta un model la diferite fațete ale cunoștințelor (de exemplu, adaptoare dedicate limbajului și/sau sarcinilor). Reglarea fină slabă este expresivă, deoarece controlează comportamentul tuturor componentelor modelului. În această lucrare, introducem o nouă metodă de reglare fină cu ambele proprietăți dorite. În special, învățăm măști rare, cu valoare reală bazate pe o variantă simplă a ipotezei biletelor loteriei. Măștile specifice activităților sunt obținute din date adnotate într-o limbă sursă și măștile specifice limbii din modelarea limbii mascate într-o limbă țintă. Ambele măști pot fi apoi compuse cu modelul pretrained. Spre deosebire de reglarea fină bazată pe adaptor, această metodă nu mărește numărul de parametri la momentul inferenței și nu modifică arhitectura modelului original. Cel mai important este că depășește adaptoarele în transferul translingvistic zero-shot cu o marjă mare într-o serie de criterii de referință multilingve, inclusiv Dependențe Universale, MasakhaNER și AmericanNLI.', 'pl': 'Dostosowanie całego zestawu parametrów dużego modelu wstępnie trenowanego stało się głównym podejściem do uczenia się transferowego. Aby zwiększyć jego wydajność i zapobiec katastrofalnym zapomnieniom i zakłóceniom, opracowano techniki takie jak adaptery i rzadkie dostrajanie. Adaptery są modułowe, ponieważ można je łączyć w celu dostosowania modelu do różnych aspektów wiedzy (np. dedykowanych adapterów językowych i/lub zadań). Niewielkie dostrajanie jest ekspresyjne, ponieważ kontroluje zachowanie wszystkich elementów modelu. W niniejszej pracy wprowadzamy nową metodę dostrajania obu tych pożądanych właściwości. W szczególności uczymy się rzadkich, rzeczywiście wartościowych masek opartych na prostym wariancie hipotezy losów loterijnych. Maski specyficzne dla zadań są uzyskiwane z adnotacji danych w języku źródłowym, a maski specyficzne dla języka z modelowania języka maskowanego w języku docelowym. Obie te maski można następnie skomponować za pomocą wstępnie trenowanego modelu. W przeciwieństwie do dostrajania opartego na adapterze, metoda ta nie zwiększa liczby parametrów w czasie wnioskowania ani nie zmienia oryginalnej architektury modelu. Co najważniejsze, w szeregu wielojęzycznych wskaźników porównawczych, w tym Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER i AmericasNLI, przewyższa adaptery w transporcie wielojęzycznym.', 'sr': 'Dobra prilagodba cijelog kompleta parametara velikog model a pretreniranog je postala glavni pristup učenju prijenosa. Da bi povećala svoju efikasnost i spriječila katastrofalno zaboravljanje i mešanje, razvili su tehnike poput adaptera i rezervne naprave. Adapteri su modularni, jer se mogu kombinirati kako bi se prilagodili model na različite lica znanja (npr. posvećeni jezik i/ili adapteri zadataka). Izgleda kao da kontroliše ponašanje svih modelnih komponenta. U ovom poslu predstavljamo novu metodu za fino podešavanje obje željne vlasništva. Posebno, naučimo rezervnu masku, stvarno vrijednu masku na osnovu jednostavne varijante Loterijske kartice hipoteze. Maske za određene zadatke dobijaju se od annotiranih podataka na izvornom jeziku, i maske za jezik iz maskiranog jezika na ciljnom jeziku. Oboje maske mogu biti sastavljene sa pretkišenim modelom. Za razliku od dobre prilagodbe na adapteru, ova metoda ne povećava broj parametara u vrijeme infekcije niti menja originalnu arhitekturu modela. Najvažnije, to nadmašuje adaptere na nulo-pogođenom krstojezičkom prenošenju velikom marginom u nizu višejezičkih kriterija, uključujući univerzalne zavisnosti, MasahaNER i AmerikasNLI.', 'kk': 'Үлкен өзгертілген үлгі моделінің барлық параметрлерін жақсы баптау оқыту үшін негізгі арқылы болды. Өзінің эффективнілігін көтеру және катастрофиялық ұмыттауды және интерфейсін бұғаттау үшін адаптер пен кеңістік баптаулар секілді техникалар жасалған. Адапторлар модульдер, өйткені олар білім тәртібінің үлгісін өзгертуге болады (мысалы, тіл және/немесе тапсырма адаптерлері). Бүкіл үлгі компоненттердің қасиеттерін бақылау үшін кеңісті түзету өрнекті. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, бұл жеткілікті қасиеттердің екеуінде жаңа баптау әдісін таңдаймыз. Әсіресе, біз Лотерия тикет гипотезесінің қарапайым түрлендірілген қалқаларды үйренеміз. Тапсырманың ерекше қалқалары көзінің тілінде белгіленген деректерден, мәліметті тілден қалқалау үшін тілді ерекше қалқалардан алады. Бұл қалқалар екі қалқалар содан кейінгі үлгімен жазылады. Адаптердің негізінде дұрыс баптау әдісіне сәйкес, бұл әдіс параметрлердің санын бақылау уақытта көбейтпейді, бастапқы үлгі архитектурасын өзгертпейді. Ең маңызды, ол бірнеше тілдердің көпшілікті бағдарламалардың бірнеше тілдердің көпшілікті көпшілікті аударып, нөл- түрлі тілдердің адаптеріне аударып жатқан адаптерді өзгертеді.', 'so': "Fine-tuning the entire set of parameters of a large pretrained model has become the mainstream approach for transfer learning.  Si ay u kordhiso awooddiisa iyo ka hor marsadaan halmaanidda dhibaatada, waxaa la hormariyey teknolojiyada sida adapteyaasha iyo badbaadada wanaagga. Adapters waa qaab adag, sababtoo ah waxaa lagu isku dari karaa in lagu beddelo tusaale u leexiyo wejiyada aqoonta kala duduwan (tusaale ahaan luqada gaarka ah iyo/ama hagaajiyayaasha shaqada). Iswidishku waa mid aad u muuqata, sida uu u maamulo dabeecada noocyada oo dhan. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab cusub oo wanaagsan oo labadaas tayo leh. Si gaar ah, waxaynu barnaa dabool, qiimaha dhabta ah oo ku saleysan kala duduwan Ticket Hypothesis. Macluumaad cayiman oo shaqo ah waxaa laga helaa macluumaad lagu caddeeyey luqada aad ku qoran karto, luuqadana waxaa laga helaa maskax gaar ah oo laguugu sameynayo tusaale ahaan luqada caadiga ah. Labadaas maskood waxaa lagu sameyn karaa model la soo jeeday. Isku duwan qurxin sawir ah oo ku saleysan adapteer, qaabkanu ma kordhiyo tirada lambarka waqtiga la'aanta ama beddelin dhismaha asalka ah. Inta ugu muhiimsan waxaa lagu sameeyaa bedelka luqada nuurka ah oo lagu wareejiyo marxalad badan oo kala duduwan qaramado kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ka mid ah dhamaanka jaamacadda, MasakhaNER iyo ameerikaasNLI.", 'si': 'ලොකු ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන්ඩ් මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම් ඒක ගොඩක් වැඩි කරන්න සහ අනතුරු අමතක වෙන්න සහ අන්තිමත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, අන්තිමත් වගේ විද්\u200dයාපාර වගේ විද්\u200dය ඇඩාප්ටර්ස් මොඩියුලර්, ඔවුන්ට මොඩියුලර් එකතු වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට දැනගන්න (උදාහරණය, විශේෂ භාෂා සහ/වැ Name මේ වැඩේ අපි අලුත් විශේෂ විධානයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා මේ අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් දෙන්නම්. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා, ඇත්තටම විශේෂයෙන් ලොට්\u200dරියි ටිකෙට් හායිපෝටේස් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200d මූල භාෂාවක් සහ භාෂාව විශේෂ භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණය කරපු භාෂාවක් මෝඩල් වලින් විශේෂ විශේෂ මස්කර මේ මාස්ක් දෙන්නම පුළුවන් පස්සේ ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරේන් මොඩේල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න. ඇඩාප්ටර් අධිරූපකය සඳහා හොඳ සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන්, මේ විධානය නැති වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණ කාලයේ සැකසුම් සංඛ ගොඩක් වැදගත්, ඒක නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ ශූන්ය විශාල භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් විශාල භාෂාවක් වලින් විශාල භාෂාවක බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වලින', 'sv': 'Finjustering av hela uppsättningen parametrar för en stor förkränad modell har blivit det huvudsakliga tillvägagångssättet för transferlärande. För att öka effektiviteten och förhindra katastrofal glömska och störningar har tekniker som adaptrar och sparsam finjustering utvecklats. Adaptrar är modulära, eftersom de kan kombineras för att anpassa en modell till olika kunskapsaspekter (t.ex. dedikerade språk- och/eller uppgiftsadaptrar). Spar finjustering är uttrycksfull, eftersom den styr beteendet hos alla modellkomponenter. I detta arbete introducerar vi en ny finjusteringsmetod med båda dessa önskvärda egenskaper. I synnerhet lär vi oss glesa masker med verkligt värde baserat på en enkel variant av Lottery Ticket Hypothesis. Aktivitetsspecifika masker erhålls från kommenterade data på ett källspråk och språkspecifika masker från maskerad språkmodellering på ett målspråk. Båda dessa masker kan sedan komponeras med den förkränade modellen. Till skillnad från adapterbaserad finjustering ökar denna metod varken antalet parametrar vid inferenstiden eller ändrar den ursprungliga modellarkitekturen. Viktigast av allt är att det överträffar adaptrar i noll-skott tvärspråklig överföring med stor marginal i en rad flerspråkiga riktmärken, inklusive Universal Dependences, MasakhaNER och AmericasNLI.', 'no': 'Dette heile innstillinga av parametrar i ein stor modell har blitt hovudtilnærming for å læra overføringar. For å øke effektiviteten og forebygge katastrofisk glemme og interferens, er teknikke som adapterande og sparse finnstillingar utvikla. Adaptarar er modular, sidan dei kan kombinasjonast for å tilpassa eit modell mot ulike oppsett av kunnskap (f.eks. spesifiserte språk og/eller oppgåveadaptarar). Dette er uttrykk for å setja opp alle modellekomponentane. I denne arbeiden introduserer vi ein ny finnstillingsmetode med begge disse desilege eigenskapane. I særskilt lærer vi sparke, verkeleg verdierte masker basert på ein enkel variant av Lottery Ticket Hypothesis. Oppgåvespesifikke masker vert henta frå markerte data i eit kjeldespråk, og språksspesifikke masker frå maskerte språksmodellering i eit målspråk. Begge desse maskene kan derfor lagrast med den pretrende modellen. I motsetjing til adapteringsbasert finnstilling, denne metoden aukar ikkje talet på parametrar ved inferensningstid eller endrar den originale modellen. Dei viktigste er at det utfører tilpassarar i nullstatt krysspråk overføring av ein stor margin i ein serie av fleirspråk benchmarker, inkludert universelle avhengighet, MasakhaNER og AmericasNLI.', 'ta': 'ஒரு பெரிய மாதிரியின் அளவுருக்களின் முழு அளபுருக்களையும் சரியாக மாற்றி கற்றத்தை மாற்றுவதற்கு முக்கியமான வழியாக ஆக அதின் விளைவை அதிகரிக்க மற்றும் துன்பத்தை மறந்து மற்றும் இடைவெளியை தடுப்பதற்கு, ஒப்புக்கொள்பவர்கள் போன்ற தொழில்நுட்ப முறை Adapters are modular, as they can combine a model to adapt to different knowledge faces (e.g. dedicated language and/or task adapters). இது அனைத்து மாதிரி பொருளின் செயல்பாட்டை கட்டுப்படுத்தும் போது, செங்குத்து நன்று தூண்டுதல் காட்சிய In this work, we introduce a new fine-tuning method with both these desirable properties.  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் சிறிதாக, உண்மையான மதிப்புள்ள முகங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்கிறோம் லோட்டரி டிக்ட் ஹைப்பாட்சிஸ வேலைக்குறிப்பிட்ட முகங்கள் மூலத்தின் மொழியிலிருந்து அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தரவுகள் மற்றும் மொழியிலிருந்து குறிப்பிட் இவ்விரண்டு முகங்களும் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியால் உருவாக்கப்பட முடியும். அடிப்படையில் உள்ள அடிப்படையான சரியான மூடுதல், இந்த முறைமை குறைந்த நேரத்தில் அளபுருக்களின் எண்ணிக்கையை அதிகரிக்கவில்லை மூல மிகவும் முக்கியமானது, அது பூஜ்ஜியமான மொழி மொழி மாற்றியில் ஒதுக்கீட்டாளர்களை செயல்படுத்துகிறது, பல மொழி பெங்குத்துக்களில் உள்ள மாற்றும் பெரிய மொழிகளில', 'ur': 'ایک بڑے پرٹرینڈ موڈل کے تمام پارامتروں کا سٹ اچھا تغییر کیا گیا ہے کہ تغییر سکھانے کے لئے اصلی طریقہ ہو گیا ہے. اس کے مطابق اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اور مصیبت کے بھول جانے اور اختلاف سے روکنے کے لئے، اڈپٹر اور مضبوط نیٹ تنظیم کی طرح طریقے کی گئی ہیں۔ اڈپٹر موڈولر ہیں، کیونکہ وہ ایک مدل کو علم کے مختلف چہروں کے ساتھ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے متصل کر سکتے ہیں Sparse fine-tuning is expressive, as it controls the behavior of all model components. اس کام میں ہم نے ایک نئی پاکیزہ تنظیم طریقہ پہنچایا ہے ان دونوں کے خواہش داروں کے ساتھ۔ مخصوصا، ہم اسپرس، حقیقی ارزش دار ماسک سیکھتے ہیں لوتری ٹیکٹ ہیپیٹیس کی ایک ساده تغییر پر۔ Task-specific masks are obtained from annotated data in a source language, and language-specific masks from masked language modeling in a target language. یہ دونوں ماسک اس کے بعد آرام کی مدل سے پیدا کئے جائیں گے۔ اڈپٹر بنیاد پاکیزہ تنظیم کے بغیر، یہ طریقہ نہ پارامیٹروں کی تعداد زیادہ کرتا ہے اور نہ اصلی موڈل معماری تغییر کرتا ہے. بہت اہم ہے کہ یہ صفر-شٹ کرس-زبان ترنسفور میں اڈپٹر کو ایک بڑی مارجین کے ذریعہ سے بہت سی زبان بانچ مارکیوں میں اضافہ کرتا ہے، جیسے Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER اور AmericasNLI کے شامل ہے.', 'uz': "Katta taqdimot modelining butun parametrlarni birlashtirish uchun o'rganish uchun asosiy usul bo'ladi. Ularning effektligini oshirish va katak o'zgartirish va o'zgarishni kuzatish uchun, tugmalar kabi adapter va yaxshi suhbat tugmalarini yaratish mumkin. Adapter modullar, chunki ular har xil bilan boshqa shakllarga modelni birlashtirish mumkin (m. g. tugmalar va/yoki vazifa oʻzgarishlar). Name Bu ishda biz bu ikkita xususiyatlar bilan yangi yaxshi suhbat usulni anglatamiz. In particular, we learn sparse, real-valued masks based on a simple variant of the Lottery Ticket Hypothesis.  Name Keyin bu ikkita uskuna o'xshash model bilan yaratishi mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Ko'pchilik muhim bo'lsa, bu bir necha tillar tarkibini o'zgartiradi va ko'plab tillar tarkibida ko'plab bog'lanadi. Universal qiymatlari, MasakhaNER va Amerikansa", 'vi': 'Hoàn chỉnh toàn bộ các tham số của một mô hình lớn được xem thường đã trở thành phương pháp chính trong việc học chuyển nhượng. Để tăng hiệu quả và ngăn chặn sự lãng quên và can thiệp thảm họa, các kỹ thuật như adapters và hào quang lỏng lẻo đã được phát triển. Các phương tiện thích hợp có thể được kết hợp để thích ứng mô hình với các khía cạnh khác nhau của kiến thức (v.d. ngôn ngữ đặc biệt và/ hay adapter tác vụ). Rất rõ nét, vì nó điều khiển hành vi của mọi thành phần mô hình. Trong công việc này, chúng ta sẽ có một phương pháp cải thiện mới với cả hai tính chất đáng yêu này. Chúng tôi học được các mặt nạ tầm thường, giá trị thực dựa trên giả thuyết Vé xổ số. Mặt nạ đặc nhiệm được lấy từ dữ liệu được ghi chú bằng ngôn ngữ gốc, và mặt nạ ngôn ngữ đặc trưng được lấy từ thiết kế ngôn ngữ đeo mặt nạ tại ngôn ngữ đích. Cả hai mặt nạ này có thể được hình thành với hình mẫu trước. Không giống với độ chỉnh sửa, phương pháp này không làm tăng số tham số vào lúc nhận ra hay thay đổi cấu trúc mẫu gốc. Quan trọng nhất, nó vượt trội các adapters trong việc chuyển đổi ngôn ngữ khác nhau bằng một khoảng không lớn trong một loạt các tiêu chuẩn đa dạng, bao gồm những thải chung, MasakhaNER, và Americano.', 'fa': 'تغییر دادن کل مجموعه پارامترهای یک مدل بزرگ پیش ریخته شده، روش اصلی برای یادگیری انتقال تبدیل شده است. برای افزایش فعالیت و جلوگیری از فراموش و interference فاجعه\u200cای، تکنیک\u200cهایی مانند adapters و نیکوترین تغییرات کمی توسعه شده است. Adapters are modular, as they can be combined to adapt a model to different faces of knowledge (e.g., dedicated language and/or task adapters). تنظیمات قطعی استفاده می\u200cکند، در حالی که رفتار همه\u200cی رشته\u200cهای مدل را کنترل می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما یک روش جدید با این دو ویژه\u200cهای خواسته را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. مخصوصا، ما ماسک های ذخیره و ارزش واقعی را بر اساس یک تغییر ساده از لیتری تیک هایپیوتس یاد می گیریم. ماسک\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از داده\u200cهای یادآوری در زبان منبع و ماسک\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از مدل زبان ماسک\u200cشده در زبان هدف می\u200cگیرند. هر دوی این ماسک ها می توانند با مدل پیش ریخته شوند. برخلاف تنظیمات پاکیزه بر اساس adapter، این روش تعداد پارامترها در زمان بیماری افزایش نمی\u200cکند و معماری اصلی را تغییر نمی\u200cدهد. مهم\u200cتر از این است که در انتقال زبان\u200cهای مختلف صفر با یک مرز بزرگ در مجموعه\u200cهای سنجیره\u200cهای زیادی زبان، شامل اعتمادی جهانی، ماساکاNER و آمریکانی NLI، اضافه کننده\u200cها را اجرا می\u200cکند. بر اساس یک تحلیل عمیق، ما اضافه می\u200cکنیم که پارکیسیت برای جلوگیری از interference هر دو ۱) بین تغییرات عمیقی که باید ساخته شود و ۲) تغییر مناسب است. ما کد و مدل را در\n\n', 'nl': 'Het finetunen van de hele set parameters van een groot vooraf getraind model is uitgegroeid tot de mainstream aanpak voor transfer learning. Om de efficiëntie te verhogen en catastrofale vergeten en interferentie te voorkomen, zijn technieken zoals adapters en schaarse finetuning ontwikkeld. Adapters zijn modulair, omdat ze kunnen worden gecombineerd om een model aan te passen aan verschillende facetten van kennis (bijvoorbeeld speciale taal- en/of taakadapters). Sparse fine-tuning is expressief, omdat het het gedrag van alle modelcomponenten regelt. In dit werk introduceren we een nieuwe fine-tuning methode met beide gewenste eigenschappen. In het bijzonder leren we schaarse, echt gewaardeerde maskers gebaseerd op een eenvoudige variant van de Loterij Ticket Hypothese. Taakspecifieke maskers worden verkregen uit geannoteerde gegevens in een brontaal en taalspecifieke maskers uit gemaskeerde taalmodellering in een doeltaal. Beide maskers kunnen vervolgens worden samengesteld met het voorgetrainde model. In tegenstelling tot adaptergebaseerde fine-tuning verhoogt deze methode niet het aantal parameters op inferentietijd, noch verandert de oorspronkelijke modelarchitectuur. Het belangrijkste is dat het adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer met een grote marge overtreft in een reeks meertalige benchmarks, waaronder Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER en AmericasNLI. Op basis van een diepgaande analyse vinden we bovendien dat sparsity cruciaal is om zowel 1) interferentie tussen de te componeren finetunings als 2) overfitting te voorkomen. We geven de code en modellen uit op\n\n', 'ko': '마이크로 조정 대형 예비 훈련 모델의 전체 매개 변수는 이미 이동 학습의 주류 방법이 되었다.효율을 높이고 재난성 망각과 방해를 방지하기 위해 어댑터와 희소 마이크로스피커 등 기술을 개발했다.어댑터는 모듈화된 것이다. 왜냐하면 그들은 함께 조합하여 모델을 지식의 다양한 측면(예를 들어 전용 언어와/또는 작업 어댑터)에 적응시킬 수 있기 때문이다.희소미조는 모든 모델 어셈블리의 동작을 제어하기 때문에 표현력이 있습니다.이 업무에서 우리는 새로운 미조정 방법을 소개했는데, 이 두 가지 이상적인 성격을 가지고 있다.특히 복권 가설을 바탕으로 한 간단한 변체의 희소한 실가 마스크를 배웠다.작업별 마스크는 소스 언어의 주석 데이터에서, 언어별 마스크는 대상 언어의 마스크 언어 모델링에서 가져옵니다.이 두 마스크는 모두 예훈련 모형으로 합성할 수 있다.어댑터를 기반으로 하는 마이크로스피커와 달리 이런 방법은 추리할 때의 매개 변수 수량을 증가하지 않을 뿐만 아니라 원시 모델 체계 구조도 바꾸지 않는다.가장 중요한 것은 Universal Dependencies,MasakhaNER, Americas NLI를 포함한 일련의 다중 언어 기준 테스트에서 어댑터보다 0회 다중 언어 이동이 훨씬 낫다는 것이다.깊이 있게 분석한 토대에서 우리는 희소성이 1) 합성해야 하는 미조 간의 간섭과 2) 과도한 의합을 방지하는 데 매우 중요하다는 것을 발견했다.우리\n\n', 'bg': 'Финото настройване на целия набор от параметри на голям предварително обучен модел се превърна в основен подход за трансферно обучение. За да се повиши ефективността му и да се предотврати катастрофално забравяне и смущения, са разработени техники като адаптери и рядко фино настройване. Адаптерите са модулни, тъй като могат да бъдат комбинирани, за да адаптират модела към различни аспекти на знанието (например специализиран език и/или адаптери за задачи). Спалното фино настройване е изразително, тъй като контролира поведението на всички компоненти на модела. В тази работа въвеждаме нов метод за фино настройване с тези две желани свойства. По-специално, ние научаваме оскъдни маски с реална стойност въз основа на прост вариант на хипотезата за лотарийни билети. Специфични за задачата маски се получават от анотирани данни в изходен език, а специфични за езика маски от маскирано езиково моделиране в целеви език. И двете маски могат да бъдат съставени с предварително тренирания модел. За разлика от фината настройка на базата на адаптер, този метод нито увеличава броя на параметрите във времето на заключение, нито променя оригиналната архитектура на модела. Най-важното е, че превъзхожда адаптерите при нулев междуезичен трансфер с голям марж в редица многоезични показатели, включително Универсални зависимости, МасакхаNER и AmericasNLI. Въз основа на задълбочен анализ, ние допълнително откриваме, че рядкостта е от решаващо значение, за да се предотврати както 1) смущения между фините настройки, които трябва да бъдат композирани, така и 2) пренасочване. Ще пуснем кода и моделите на\n\n', 'sq': 'Rregullimi i plotë i parametrave të një modeli të madh të parastërvitur është bërë metoda kryesore për transferimin e mësimit. Për të rritur efektshmërinë e saj dhe për të parandaluar harrimin katastrofik dhe ndërhyrjen, janë zhvilluar teknika si adaptuesit dhe rregullimet e pakta të hollësishme. Adapters are modular, as they can be combined to adapt a model towards different facets of knowledge (e.g., dedicated language and/or task adapters).  Ndryshimi i shpejtë është ekspresiv, pasi kontrollon sjelljen e të gjitha komponenteve të model it. Në këtë punë, ne prezantojmë një metodë të re të rregullimit me të dy këto prona të dëshirueshme. Në veçanti, mësojmë maska të vogla me vlerë reale bazuar në një variant të thjeshtë të hipotezës së biletave të lotisë. Maskat specifike për detyrat janë marrë nga të dhënat e anotuara në një gjuhë burimi dhe maska specifike për gjuhën nga modelimi i gjuhës së maskuar në një gjuhë objektiv. Të dy këto maska mund të përbëhen me modelin e parastërvitur. Ndryshe nga rregullimi i përshtatshëm bazuar në adapter, ky metodë as nuk rrit numrin e parametrave në kohën e përfundimit as nuk ndryshon arkitekturën origjinale të modelit. Më e rëndësishmja është se ajo ekziston mbi adaptuesit në transferimin zero-shot ndërgjuhësor me një margin të madh në një seri standartesh shumëgjuhësore, duke përfshirë Varësitë Universale, MasakhaNER dhe AmericasNLI. Bazuar në një analizë të thellë, ne gjithashtu gjejmë se pakësia është vendimtare për të parandaluar të dyja 1) ndërhyrjen midis rregullimeve që do të përbëhen dhe 2) mbipajtimin. Ne lëshojmë kodin dhe modelet në\n\n', 'da': 'Finjustering af hele sættet af parametre i en stor forudtrænet model er blevet den almindelige tilgang til transfer learning. For at øge effektiviteten og forhindre katastrofal glemme og interferens er der udviklet teknikker som adaptere og sparsom finjustering. Adaptere er modulopbyggede, da de kan kombineres for at tilpasse en model til forskellige facetter af viden (f.eks. dedikerede sprog- og/eller opgaveadaptere). Sparsom finjustering er udtryksfuld, da den styrer opførselen af alle modelkomponenter. I dette arbejde introducerer vi en ny finjusteringsmetode med begge disse ønskelige egenskaber. Især lærer vi sparsomme masker med reel værdi baseret på en simpel variant af lotteri billet hypotesen. Opgavespecifikke masker hentes fra annoterede data på et kildesprog og sprogspecifikke masker fra maskeret sprogmodellering på et målsprog. Begge disse masker kan derefter sammensættes med den fortrænede model. I modsætning til adapterbaseret finjustering øger denne metode hverken antallet af parametre ved slutningstidspunktet eller ændrer den oprindelige modelarkitektur. Vigtigst af alt er, at det overgår adaptere i nulskud tværsproget overførsel med stor margin i en række flersprogede benchmarks, herunder Universal Dependences, MasakhaNER og AmericasNLI. Baseret på en dybdegående analyse finder vi desuden, at sparsomhed er afgørende for at forhindre både 1) interferens mellem de finjusteringer, der skal komponeres, og 2) overmontering. Vi frigiver koden og modellerne på\n\n', 'sw': "Kupambana vizuri vipimo vyote vya kipimo kikubwa cha mifano yenye sura imekuwa njia ya msingi kwa ajili ya kuhamisha kujifunza. Ili kuongeza ufanisi wake na kuzuia kusahau na kuingilia janga, mbinu kama mabadiliko na kupunguza vizuri vimeundwa. Watumiaji wanaweza kuunganishwa ili kubadilisha muundo kwenye uso mbalimbali wa maarifa (kwa mfano, lugha maalum na/au juhudi). Kupambana na ujumbe mzuri unaonyesha, kwa sababu inadhibiti tabia za vifaa vyote vya mifano. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha njia mpya ya mafunzo yenye utamaduni huu. In particular, we learn sparse, real-valued masks based on a simple variant of the Lottery Ticket Hypothesis.  Vifaa maalumu vya kazi vinapatikana na taarifa zilizotajwa kwa lugha ya asili, na vifua maalum vya lugha kutoka kwenye mifano ya lugha inayoonyesha kwa lugha yenye lengo. Viwili hivi vifaa vinaweza kutengenezwa na mifano iliyotarajiwa. Tofauti na mfumo mzuri wa mazingira, mbinu hii haiongezeki idadi ya parameter kwa muda usio na ugonjwa wala kubadilisha ujenzi wa msingi wa model. Kimuhimu zaidi, inafanya mabadiliko katika usafirishaji wa lugha sifuri na marufuku makubwa katika mfululizo wa bendera za lugha mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na Uhuru wa Kimataifa, MasakhaNER, na Marekani NLI. Kutokana na uchambuzi wa kina kina, tunaona kwa kiasi kikubwa kwamba unyang'anyiko ni muhimu kuzuia kati ya mazingira yanayotengenezwa na 2) yanayosambaa. Tunaachia sheria na mifano katika\n\n", 'de': 'Die Feinabstimmung des gesamten Parametersatzes eines großen vortrainierten Modells ist zum Mainstream-Ansatz für Transferlernen geworden. Um die Effizienz zu erhöhen und katastrophales Vergessen und Interferenzen zu verhindern, wurden Techniken wie Adapter und spärliche Feinabstimmung entwickelt. Adapter sind modular aufgebaut, da sie kombiniert werden können, um ein Modell an verschiedene Wissensfacetten anzupassen (z.B. dedizierte Sprach- und/oder Aufgabenadapter). Sparte Feinabstimmung ist ausdrucksstark, da sie das Verhalten aller Modellkomponenten steuert. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir eine neue Feinabstimmungsmethode mit diesen beiden wünschenswerten Eigenschaften vor. Insbesondere lernen wir spärliche, reale Masken, basierend auf einer einfachen Variante der Lotteriescheinhypothese. Aufgabenspezifische Masken werden aus annotierten Daten in einer Quellsprache und sprachspezifische Masken aus maskierten Sprachmodellierungen in einer Zielsprache bezogen. Beide Masken können dann mit dem vortrainierten Modell zusammengesetzt werden. Im Gegensatz zur adapterbasierten Feinabstimmung erhöht diese Methode weder die Anzahl der Parameter zur Inferenzzeit noch verändert sie die ursprüngliche Modellarchitektur. Vor allem übertrifft es Adapter bei Zero-Shot-Cross-Lingual-Transfer in einer Reihe von mehrsprachigen Benchmarks, einschließlich Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER und AmericasNLI, erheblich. Basierend auf einer eingehenden Analyse stellen wir außerdem fest, dass Sparsität entscheidend ist, um sowohl 1) Interferenzen zwischen den zu komponierenden Feinabstimmungen als auch 2) Überfitting zu verhindern. Wir veröffentlichen den Code und die Modelle unter\n\n', 'hr': 'Dobra prilagodba cijelog kompleta parametara velikog model a preliječenog je postala glavni pristup učenju prijenosa. Da bi se povećala učinkovitost i spriječila katastrofalno zaboravljanje i mešanje, razvijene su tehnike poput adaptera i rezervne finalizacije. Adapteri su modularni, jer se mogu kombinirati kako bi se prilagodili model na različite lica znanja (npr. posvećeni jezik i/ili adapteri zadataka). Izvišeno je ispravno ispravno, jer kontrolira ponašanje svih modelnih komponenata. U ovom poslu predstavljamo novu metodu ispravljanja obje željne vlasništva. Posebno, naučimo rezervne maske, stvarno vrijedne maske na temelju jednostavne variante hipoteze Loterijske kartice. Osebne maske za zadatke dobijaju se od annotiranih podataka na izvornom jeziku i maske za jezik iz maskiranog jezika na ciljnom jeziku. Obje te maske mogu biti sastavljene s pretkišenim modelom. Za razliku od dobre prilagodbe na adapteri, ova metoda ne povećava broj parametara u vrijeme infekcije niti promijeni originalnu arhitekturu modela. Najvažnije, to nadmašuje adaptere na nulo-pucanju preko jezika preko velike margine u nizu višejezičkih kriterija, uključujući univerzalne zavisnosti, MasakhaNER i AmericasNLI. Na temelju detaljne analize, dodatno smatramo da je sparsitet ključno za sprječavanje obje 1) interferencije između kompozicije fina i 2) prekopterećenja. Puštamo šifru i modele\n\n', 'af': "Fine-tuning van die hele stel van parameters van 'n groot pretreënde model het die hoofstreim toegang geword vir oordrag leer. Om sy effektiviteit te vermeerder en te voorkom katastrofiese vergeet en interferensie, is teknike soos adapters en sparse fintuning ontwikkel. Adapters is modular, omdat hulle kan gekombineer word om 'n model te pas na verskillende aangesigte van kennis (bv. aangedediseerde taal en/of taak-adapters). Name In hierdie werk introduseer ons 'n nuwe fin-tuning metode met beide hierdie desimale eienskappe. Spesifieke, ons leer sparse, reël waardeerde maskers gebaseer op 'n eenvoudige variant van die Lotterie Tikket Hypothesis. Opdrag- spesifieke maskers word ontvang van notateerde data in 'n bron taal, en taal- spesifieke maskers van maskeerde taal modellering in 'n doel taal. Beide hierdie maskers kan dan gemaak word met die pretreënde model. Ongelyks van adapter-gebaseerde fyn-tuning, hierdie metode vergroot nie die nommer van parameters by inferensie tyd of verander die oorspronklike model-architecture nie. Mees belangriks, dit uitvoer adapters in nul-skoot kruistale oordrag deur 'n groot marjin in 'n reeks van multilinglike benchmarke, insluitend Universele afhanklikheid, MasakhaNER en AmericasNLI. Basies op 'n in-diepte analisie, vind ons additionally dat sparsiteit is crucial om beide 1) interferensie te voorkom tussen die fin-tunings wat geskep moet word en 2) oorvloei. Ons verlos die kode en modele op\n\n", 'id': 'Penyesuaian seluruh set parameter model besar yang dilatih telah menjadi pendekatan utama untuk belajar transfer. Untuk meningkatkan efisiensinya dan mencegah melupakan dan gangguan bencana, teknik seperti adaptor dan penyesuaian ringan telah dikembangkan. Adapter modular, karena mereka dapat digabungkan untuk mengadaptasi model menuju aspek yang berbeda pengetahuan (contohnya, bahasa dedikasi dan/atau adapt or tugas). Penyesuaian ringan adalah ekspresif, karena mengontrol perilaku semua komponen model. In this work, we introduce a new fine-tuning method with both these desirable properties.  Terutama, kita belajar topeng yang sedikit, bernilai nyata berdasarkan variasi sederhana dari hipotesis tiket loteri. Topeng spesifik tugas diperoleh dari data anotasi dalam bahasa sumber, dan topeng spesifik bahasa dari model bahasa bertopeng dalam bahasa sasaran. Kedua topeng ini kemudian dapat dikomposisikan dengan model yang dilatih. Tidak seperti penyesuaian terbasis adaptor, metode ini tidak meningkatkan jumlah parameter pada waktu inferensi atau mengubah arsitektur model asli. Yang paling penting, ia melampaui penampilan adaptor dalam transfer saling bahasa dengan 0 tembakan dengan margin besar dalam seri benchmarks multibahasa, termasuk Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, dan AmerikasNLI. Berdasarkan analisis dalam, kami tambahan menemukan bahwa kecepatan adalah penting untuk mencegah kedua-duanya 1) gangguan antara penyesuaian yang harus dikomposisikan dan 2) overfitting. Kami melepaskan kode dan model di\n\n', 'am': "በተለየ ትልቅ ምርጫዎች በሙሉ አካባቢዎች ላይ ማቀናቀል የመጀመሪያው ልማድ ሆኖአል፡፡ ጥያቄውን ለማበዛት እና የጥፋት ስርሳ እና መግለጫ ለመከለከል፣ እንደተሳታፊዎች እና እንደተሳሳተ ጥያቄዎች ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ አዲስ አዲስ ዶላር ናቸው፡፡ ምርጫዎች በዚህ ስራ፣ እነዚህን ሁለቱ በሚፈልጉት ሀብት አዲስ ጥያቄን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የቅርብ ብዛት፣ የእውነቱ አካባቢ መቆሚያ እናውቃለን፡፡ የፋይል ስም በዚያን ጊዜም ሁለቱ መሳፍንቶች በተከፋፈሉት ምሳሌ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ከሁሉም አስፈላጊው፣ በክፍለ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የተለወጠውን አዲስታተር በሙሉ ብዙዎች የቋንቋዎች አዋራጆች፣ ማካሄናር እና አሜሪካውያን እና አሜሪካ በጥልቅ ትምህርት በተደረገ፣ በጥልቅ ማስተያየት እና በ2 ጥሩ ጥሩ መቀላቀል መግለጫ መሆኑን እናገኛለን፡፡ የኮድ እና ሞዴላዎችን እናወጣለን\n\n", 'bn': 'বিশাল প্রেমিডেন মডেলের পুরো প্যারামিটার সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সুন্দর করা হয়েছে শিক্ষা পরিবর্তনের জন্য। তার কার্যক্রম বৃদ্ধি এবং বিপর্যয় ভুলে যাওয়া এবং বিরত রাখার জন্য, এডাপ্টরের মত প্রযুক্তি এবং সুন্দর সংক্রান্ত প্রযুক্তি উন্ন এডাপ্টাররা মডিউল, কারণ তারা বিভিন্ন জ্ঞানের মুখের দিকে একটি মডেল আপ্যাডেট করতে পারে (যেমন বিশেষ ভাষা এবং/অথবা কাজের অ্যাডা স্প্যারের সুন্দর সংক্রান্ত প্রকাশিত, যেহেতু এটি সকল মডেল কম্পোনেন্টের আচরণ নিয়ন্ত্রণ করে। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা একটি নতুন ভালো টিউনিং পদ্ধতি পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি এই দুইজনের বৈশিষ্ট্য দিয়ে। বিশেষ করে, আমরা লোটারি টিকেট হাইপোটেসিসের একটি সাধারণ ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে স্প্যাস, সত্যিকারের মুখোশ শ শিখি। কাজের নির্দিষ্ট মুখোশ একটি উৎস ভাষা থেকে বিস্তারিত তথ্য এবং লক্ষ্য ভাষায় মুখোশিত ভাষা মডেলিং থেকে ভাষায় নির্দিষ্ তারপর এই দুই মুখোশগুলো প্রেমিক মডেলের সাথে তৈরি করতে পারে। অ্যাডাপ্টার-ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিন্ন সুন্দর সংস্কার, এই পদ্ধতি অক্ষতির সময়ে প্যারামিটার বৃদ্ধি করে না এবং মূল মড Most importantly, it outperforms adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer by a large margin in a series of multilingual benchmarks, including Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, and AmericasNLI.  গভীরভাবে বিশ্লেষণের ভিত্তিতে আমরা আরো দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে স্পারিসিটি উভয়কে প্রতিরোধ করার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। আমরা কোড আর মডেল মুক্তি দেই\n\n', 'az': "Bütün böyük nümunədir modellərin parametrlərini təmizləndirmək öyrənmək üçün çox təmiz tərzi oldu. Növbəti artırmaq və katastrofi unutmaq və müdahalesini öndərmək üçün, adapter kimi tekniklər və istifadə etmək üçün hazırlanmışdır. Adapter modulardır, çünki onlar bir modeli elmin müxtəlif tərzlərinə uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün birləşdirilmiş olarlar. Bütün model komponentlərin davranışlarını kontrol edir. Bu işdə hər ikimizin istədiyi xüsusiyyətləri ilə yeni təmizləmə metodu tanıyırıq. Özellikle, Lotteri Ticket Hipotesi'nin basit variablarına dayanan, istifadə edilən, qiymətli maskaları öyrənirik. Task-specific maskaları məqsəd dilində bildirilmiş məlumatlardan alınır, və dillərin müəyyən edilmiş dil modellərindən gizlənmiş maskalardan alınır. Bu maskalar hər ikisi də pretrained modeli ilə yaradıla bilər. adapter-based fine-tuning kimi, bu metod həmin zamanda parametrlərin sayını artırmaz və orijinal modeli arhitektürünü dəyişməz. Ən çox mövcuddur, bu, çoxlu dil benchmarklərinin bir səviyyəsində çoxlu səviyyəsi ilə sıfır-səviyyəsi ilə çoxlu dəyişiklik tərəfindən adapterləri üstün edir, həmçin in Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER və AmericasNLI də dahil edir. Yerli analiziyə baxmayaraq, həmçin in də belə rastlaşırıq ki, hər ikisinin birləşdirilməsi və 2-sinin birləşdirilməsi ilə birləşdirilməsi üçün istifadə etmək üçün çox mövcuddur. Biz kodu və modelləri\n\n", 'ca': "La perfeccionació de tot el conjunt de paràmetres d'un gran model pre-entrenat s'ha convertit en l'enfocament principal de l'aprenentatge de transfer ència. Per augmentar la seva eficiència i prevenir l'oblidança i l'interferència catastròfiques, s'han desenvolupat tècniques com adaptadors i pocs ajustes. Els adaptadors són modulars, perquè es poden combinar per adaptar un model a diferents aspectes del coneixement (per exemple, adaptadors de llenguatge i/o tasca). L'ajustament ràpid és expressiu, mentre controla el comportament de tots els components models. En aquesta feina introduïm un nou mètode d'ajustament amb les dues propietats desitjables. En particular, aprenem màscares escases i de valor real basades en una simple variant de l'hipòtesi de bitllets de loteria. Les màscares específices de la tasca es obtienen a partir de dades anotates en un llenguatge de font, i màscares específices de llenguatge a partir de modelar un llenguatge mascat en un llenguatge d'objectiu. Ambdues màscares poden ser compostes amb el model de pré-entrenament. A diferència de l'ajustament basat en l'adaptador, aquest mètode ni augmenta el nombre de paràmetres en el moment de la inferència ni altera l'arquitectura original del model. Most importantly, it outperforms adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer by a large margin in a series of multilingual benchmarks, including Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, and AmericasNLI.  Based on an in-depth analysis, we additionally find that sparsity is crucial to prevent both 1) interference between the fine-tunings to be composed and 2) overfitting.  Vam publicar el codi i els models\n\n", 'bs': 'Dobra prilagodba cijelog kompleta parametara velikog model a preliječenog je postala glavni pristup učenju prijenosa. Da bi povećala svoju učinkovitost i spriječila katastrofalno zaboravljanje i mešanje, razvili su tehnike poput adaptera i rezervne finalizacije. Adapteri su modularni, jer se mogu kombinirati kako bi se prilagodili model na različite lica znanja (npr. posvećeni jezik i/ili adapteri zadataka). Izgleda kao da kontroliše ponašanje svih modelnih komponenta. U ovom poslu predstavljamo novu metodu za finaliziranje obje poželjne vlasništva. Posebno, naučimo rezervne maske, stvarno vrijedne maske na osnovu jednostavne varijante hipoteze Loterijske karte. Maske posebnih zadataka dobijaju od annotiranih podataka na izvornom jeziku i maske za jezik iz maskiranog jezika na ciljnom jeziku. Oboje maske mogu biti sastavljene sa pretkišenim modelom. Za razliku od dobre prilagodbe na adapteru, ova metoda ne povećava broj parametara u vrijeme infekcije niti menja originalnu arhitekturu modela. Najvažnije, to nadmašuje adaptere na nulo-pucanju preko jezičkog prenošenja velikom marginom u nizu višejezičkih kriterija, uključujući univerzalne zavisnosti, MasakhaNER i AmericasNLI. Na temelju detaljne analize, dodatno smatramo da je sparsitet ključno za sprječavanje obje 1) interferencije između kompozicije fina i 2) prekopterećenja. Puštamo kod i modele na\n\n', 'cs': 'Jemné ladění celého souboru parametrů velkého předem trénovaného modelu se stalo hlavním přístupem k transferovému učení. Pro zvýšení jeho efektivity a zabránění katastrofickému zapomenutí a rušení byly vyvinuty techniky jako adaptéry a řídké jemné ladění. Adaptéry jsou modulární, protože mohou být kombinovány pro přizpůsobení modelu různým aspektům znalostí (např. specializovaným jazykovým a/nebo úkolovým adaptérům). Řídké jemné ladění je expresivní, protože řídí chování všech komponent modelu. V této práci představujeme novou metodu jemného ladění s oběma těmito žádoucími vlastnostmi. Zejména se naučíme řídké, reálně hodnotné masky založené na jednoduché variantě hypotézy loterijních losů. Masky specifické pro úkoly jsou získány z anotovaných dat ve zdrojovém jazyce a masky specifické pro jazyk z modelování maskovaného jazyka v cílovém jazyce. Obě tyto masky pak mohou být složeny s předem trénovaným modelem. Na rozdíl od adaptérového jemného ladění tato metoda nezvyšuje počet parametrů v době vyvození, ani nemění původní architekturu modelu. Nejdůležitější je, že adaptéry při nulovém přenosu mezi jazyky výrazně překonávají v řadě vícejazyčných benchmarků, včetně Universal Dependences, MasakhaNER a AmericasNLI. Na základě hloubkové analýzy navíc zjišťujeme, že řídkost je klíčová pro zabránění jak 1) rušení mezi jemnými laděními, které mají být složeny, tak 2) přesahování. Kód a modely uvolníme na adrese\n\n', 'et': 'Suure eeltreenitud mudeli kogu parameetrite täpsustamine on muutunud siirdeõppe põhiliseks lähenemisviisiks. Selle tõhususe suurendamiseks ning katastroofilise unustamise ja häirete vältimiseks on välja töötatud sellised tehnikad nagu adapterid ja harv peenhäälestus. Adapterid on modulaarsed, sest neid saab kombineerida mudeli kohandamiseks teadmiste erinevatele tahkudele (nt spetsiaalne keel ja/või ülesandeadapterid). Haruldane peenhäälestus on väljendusrikas, kuna see kontrollib kõigi mudeli komponentide käitumist. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut peenhäälestusmeetodit mõlema soovitava omadusega. Eelkõige õpime hõredaid, reaalse väärtusega maske, mis põhinevad lihtsal loteriipileti hüpoteesil. Ülesandespetsiifilised maskid saadakse lähtekeeles olevatest annoteeritud andmetest ja sihtkeeles kasutatavatest maskidest. Mõlemad maskid saab seejärel koostada eeltreenitud mudeliga. Erinevalt adapteril põhinevast peenhäälestusest ei suurenda see meetod parameetrite arvu järelduse ajal ega muuda algset mudeli arhitektuuri. Kõige tähtsam on see, et mitmetes mitmekeelsetes võrdlusnäitajates, sealhulgas universaalsete sõltuvuste, MasakhaNERi ja AmericasNLI, on see suure võimsusega ületanud adapterid nullkeelses ülekandes. Põhjaliku analüüsi põhjal leiame lisaks, et hõredus on oluline, et vältida nii 1) komponeeritavate peenhäälestuste vahelisi häireid kui ka 2) ülemäärast paigaldamist. Me avaldame koodi ja mudelid aadressil\n\n', 'fi': 'Laajan esikoulutetun mallin parametrien hienosäätämisestä on tullut siirtooppimisen valtavirtalähde. Tehokkuuden lisäämiseksi ja katastrofaalisen unohtamisen ja häiriöiden estämiseksi on kehitetty tekniikoita, kuten adaptereita ja harvoja hienosäätöjä. Adapterit ovat modulaarisia, koska niitä voidaan yhdistää mukauttamaan mallia eri tiedon osa-alueille (esim. oma kieli ja/tai tehtäväsovittimet). Harvoin hienosäätö on ilmeikäs, koska se ohjaa kaikkien mallikomponenttien käyttäytymistä. Tässä työssä esitellään uusi hienosäätömenetelmä, jolla on molemmat halutut ominaisuudet. Erityisesti opimme harvoja, todellisia naamioita, jotka perustuvat yksinkertaiseen lottokuponkehypoteesiin. Tehtäväkohtaiset maskit saadaan lähdekielellä tehdyistä huomautuksista ja kielikohtaiset maskit kohdekielellä tehdyistä maskeista. Molemmat naamiot voidaan sitten koota esikoulutetulla mallilla. Toisin kuin sovitinpohjainen hienosäätö, tämä menetelmä ei lisää parametrien määrää päättelyhetkellä eikä muuta alkuperäistä malliarkkitehtuuria. Tärkeintä on se, että se on paljon parempi kuin adapterit monikielisessä tiedonsiirrossa, kuten Universal Dependences, MasakhaNER ja AmericasNLI. Syvällisen analyysin perusteella huomaamme lisäksi, että sparsiteetti on ratkaisevan tärkeää sekä 1) kompostoitavien hienosäätöjen häiriöiden että 2) ylikuormituksen estämiseksi. Julkaisemme koodin ja mallit osoitteessa\n\n', 'tr': 'Ullakan ýalňyş modeliniň tüm parameterlerini yzarlamak üçin önüm öwrenmek üçin adatça yaklaşyk boldy. Etkinliýetini artmak we felaketleri ýatdan çykarmak we çykarmagyny önlemek üçin, adapter we lezzetli düzenlemek ýaly teknikler geliştirildi. Adatörler modüler, sebäbi bilim üýtgewleri bilen nusgasyny üýtgetmek üçin birleştirilip bilerler (meselâ, täze dil we/ýä taýtgewçiler). Gaýd etmek üçin ýeňlik titremesi aňsatýar, sebäbi ol hemme nusga komponentäň davranışyny kontrol edir. Bu işde, biz bu isleýän häsiýetler bilen täze taýýarlama yöntemi tanyşdyrýarys. We özellikle bolsa, Loteriýa bilen Hipotezisiň basit bir wariantyna daýanýar, hakyky deň maskeleri öwrenýäris. Görniş spesifik maskeleri çeşme dilinde nähilli maglumatlardan, we maksad dilinde maskeli maskelerden alyp alınýar. Bu ikisi de maskeler soňra ýakynlanan nusga bilen ýazylabilir. adapter tabanly gabdaly gabdaly gabdaly däl, bu yöntem çykyş wagtynda parametrolaryň sanyny baýlayamaz we orijinal nusgaty üýtgetmeýär Iň wajyp bolsa, bu näçe diller içinde 0-atly çarpaz dil göçürmeklerinde uly gabdalyk ýok edip bilýär, birnäçe dilli pratik taýýarlarynda hem Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER we AmericasNLI bilen birleşýär. Derňlikde bir analýusyna daýan ýar, biz hem diňe ýene-de ýigrimizlik 1) düzgün düzgün düzgünleriň aralygyny çykarmak üçin çözüm möhüm diýip pikir edýäris. Şahsy we nusgalary çykarýarys\n\n', 'hy': 'Մեծ նախավարժված մոդելի ամբողջ պարամետրերի լավագույնը դարձավ սովորելու փոխանցման հիմնական մոտեցումը: Որպեսզի աճի արդյունավետությունը և կանխուսափի կոտրոֆիկ մոռացումը և ներխուժումը, զարգացել են այնպիսի մեթոդներ, ինչպիսիք են ադապտերները և փոքր բարելավումը: Ադապտերները մոդուլյար են, քանի որ դրանք կարող են համադրվել մոդելի հարմարեցման համար գիտելիքի տարբեր կողմերի վրա (օրինակ, նվիրված լեզու և (կամ) խնդիրների ադապտերներ): Փոքր բարելավումը արտահայտում է, քանի որ այն վերահսկում է բոլոր մոդելային բաղադրիչների վարքը: Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր հարմարեցման մեթոդ այս երկու ցանկալի հատկությունների հետ: Մենք հատկապես սովորում ենք բազմաթիվ, իրական արժեքավոր դիմակներ, հիմնված վիճակախաղի հիպոթեզի պարզ տարբերակի վրա: Պատրաստի մասնավոր դիմակները ստանում են նատորացված տվյալների միջոցով աղբյուր լեզվով, իսկ լեզվով մասնավոր դիմակների միջոցով դիմացված լեզվի մոդելների միջոցով նպատակային լեզվով: Այս երկու դիմակները կարող են կազմել նախապատրաստված մոդելը: Ի տարբերություն ադապտերների հիմնված բարելավման, այս մեթոդը ոչ էլ չի բարձրացնում պարամետրերի թիվը հետևանքի ժամանակ, ոչ էլ չի փոխում սկզբնական մոդելի ճարտարապետությունը: Most importantly, it outperforms adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer by a large margin in a series of multilingual benchmarks, including Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, and AmericasNLI.  Հիմնվելով խորը վերլուծության վրա, մենք նաև կարծում ենք, որ հաճախականությունը կարևոր է, որպեսզի խոչընդոտենք 1) կառուցվածքի բարձրացման և 2) գերահարմարեցման միջև: Մենք հրապարակում ենք կոդը և մոդելները\n\n', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Jejaring Layout Global Nang iki jallawang, kita mulai nggawe sistem sing dibenalke nggawe layang-layang iki dadi wis dialah Link that points task-special Masks Masking iki dadi bisa ditambah, winih dumateng iki sampeyan ngono model model prek cara-cara lah Pi ngomong cara-cara, dadi iso nggawe adaptaaker liya-cara nggawe lomar tentang karo soko ibuh dumadhi kanggo kalagayet terus kanggo kalagayet terus marik karo akeh liya multilenguase', 'sk': 'Fino uravnavanje celotnega sklopa parametrov velikega predtreniranega modela je postalo glavni pristop za transferno učenje. Da bi povečali njegovo učinkovitost in preprečili katastrofalno pozabljanje in motnje, so bile razvite tehnike, kot so adapterji in redka fina nastavitev. Adapterji so modularni, saj jih je mogoče kombinirati tako, da model prilagodimo različnim vidikom znanja (npr. namenskim jezikom in/ali nalogam adapterjev). Redka fina nastavitev je izrazita, saj nadzoruje vedenje vseh komponent modela. V tem delu predstavljamo novo metodo finega uravnavanja z obema zaželenima lastnostma. Zlasti se naučimo redkih mask, ki temeljijo na preprosti različici hipoteze loterijskih kart. Maske, specifične za opravila, so pridobljene iz podatkov z opombami v izvornem jeziku, maske, specifične za jezik, pa iz modeliranja maskiranega jezika v ciljnem jeziku. Obe maski se nato lahko sestavita s predtreniranim modelom. Za razliko od finega nastavitve na osnovi adapterja ta metoda ne povečuje števila parametrov v času sklepanja niti ne spreminja originalne arhitekture modela. Najpomembnejše je, da v vrsti večjezičnih referenčnih meril, vključno z Univerzalnimi odvisnostmi, MasakhaNER in AmericasNLI, preseže adapterje pri ničelnem medjezičnem prenosu.', 'ha': "Tsarin daidaita duk parameteri na mai girma wa motel mai kiyãwa, ya kasance mazaɓa mai girma wa canza za'a shige kwamfyuta. To increase its efficiency and prevent catastrophic forgetting and interference, techniques like adapters and sparse fine-tuning have been developed.  Adappters are modular, kamar an iya haɗa su zuwa kwamfyuta motel zuwa fuskõkin zane-daban (misali, harshe da/ko adaptarin aiki). Tsarin mai kyau na fassara yana mai kyau, kamar yadda yana rinjãya aikin duk abun ayuka. Ga wannan aikin, za mu introduce wata hanyoyi mai kyau da waɗannan abũbuwan amfani. Kayyai, za'a sanar da kofi masu inganci, a kan wata variant mai sauƙi na Ticket Hypthesis. Ana motsa maɓallin aikin da aka ƙayyade shi daga data wanda aka faɗa ɗa cikin harshen source, da kuma maɓallin-harshe-ƙayyade daga misalin harshen da aka rufe da shi cikin lugha wanda aka yi amfani da. Za iya sami wannan tufafi biyu da aka baka shi da misalin da aka baka. @ info: whatsthis Ki muhimu, shi na tafiyar adaptarin cikin shifo-shekara na sifiri-lugha na shige da margin babba a cikin wasu mistakardar mulki-linguin, kamar kuma da MasakhNER da kuma amerikansan.NLI", 'bo': 'Fine-tuning the entire set of parameters of a large pretrained model has become the mainstream approach for transfer learning. རང་གི་དཔལ་འབྱོར་བ་དང་སྐྱུར་བརྗེད་མཁན་གྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་སྒོ་གཏོང་བྱེད་དགོས། བཟོ་སྐྲུན་པ་དང་ཉམས་ཞུ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཏོ སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་མཁན་མི་འདྲ་བ་རེད། Sparse fine-tuning is expressive, as it controls the behavior of all model components. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་desirable་རྒྱུ་དངོས་གཉིས་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བློ་ཞིང་དང་། རིན་ཐང་བའི་གདོང་རིས་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏེ། Task-specific masks are obtained from annotated data in a source language, and language-specific masks from masked language modeling in a target language. གདོང་རིས་འདི་དག་གཉིས་པོ་ཞིག་དག་ནི་སྔོན་པ་བཟོས་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བྲིས་ཆོག་ཡོད། Unlike adapter-based fine-tuning, this method neither increases the number of parameters at inference time nor alters the original model architecture. ཆེས་ཤིན་གཙོ་ཆེ་ཤིན་ཡིན་ན། དེ་ནི་སྐུད་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་རྒྱ་ཆེ་བའི་ནང་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག', 'he': 'Fine-tuning the entire set of parameters of a large pretrained model has become the mainstream approach for transfer learning.  To increase its efficiency and prevent catastrophic forgetting and interference, techniques like adapters and sparse fine-tuning have been developed.  Adapters are modular, as they can be combined to adapt a model towards different facets of knowledge (e.g., dedicated language and/or task adapters).  Sparse fine-tuning is expressive, as it controls the behavior of all model components.  In this work, we introduce a new fine-tuning method with both these desirable properties.  במיוחד, אנחנו לומדים מסכות נדירות, בעלות ערך אמיתי מבוססות על שונה פשוטה של היפותזיה של כרטיסי הלוטוריה. Task-specific masks are obtained from annotated data in a source language, and language-specific masks from masked language modeling in a target language.  שני המסכות האלה יכולות לאחר מכן להיות מורכבות עם המודל המתאמן. Unlike adapter-based fine-tuning, this method neither increases the number of parameters at inference time nor alters the original model architecture.  Most importantly, it outperforms adapters in zero-shot cross-lingual transfer by a large margin in a series of multilingual benchmarks, including Universal Dependencies, MasakhaNER, and AmericasNLI.'}
{'en': 'Overcoming a Theoretical Limitation of Self-Attention', 'ar': 'نحو تحيز مجموعة التعليقات التوضيحية في التعهيد الجماعي', 'pt': 'Em direção ao viés do Anotator Group em Crowdsourcing', 'es': 'Hacia el sesgo del grupo anotador en el crowdsourcing', 'fr': "Vers un biais de groupe d'annotateurs dans le crowdsourcing", 'zh': '众包中注器组偏差', 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングにおけるアノテーターグループの偏見に向けて', 'ru': 'На пути к групповой предвзятости аннотаторов в краудсорсинге', 'hi': 'Crowdsourcing में Annotator समूह पूर्वाग्रह की ओर', 'ga': 'I dTreo Laofachta Grúpa Anótaire i Sluaite', 'ka': 'Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'hu': 'Az Annotator Group Bias felé a Crowdsourcing-ben', 'kk': 'Жазбалар тобына қарсы "Crowdsourcing"', 'el': 'Προς τις προκατάληψη της ομάδας σχολιαστών στο Crowdsourcing', 'mk': 'Надвор кон групните непријатности на анотаторите во Crowdsourcing', 'it': 'Towards Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'lt': 'Žymėtojų grupės kliūtys visuomenės kūrimui', 'ml': 'sourceing', 'ms': 'Ke arah Bias Kumpulan Annotator dalam Crowdsourcing', 'mt': 'Lejn il-Bias tal-Grupp Annotatur fil-Crowdsourcing', 'mn': 'Crowdsourcing-д Annotator Group Bias руу', 'no': 'Gå til annotator- gruppe Bias i Crowdsourcing', 'pl': 'W kierunku uprzedzeń grupy Annotatorów w crowdsourcingu', 'ro': 'Towards Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'sr': 'Prema Annotator Group Bias u Crowdsourcing', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Mot annotator Group Bias i Crowdsourcing', 'so': 'Toward Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'ta': 'sourceing', 'ur': 'Crowdsourcing میں Annotator Group Bias کی طرف', 'uz': 'sourceing', 'vi': 'Nhóm người báo cáo kéo đến', 'bg': 'Към анотаторни групови предразсъдъци в crowdsourcingа', 'nl': 'Naar Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'da': 'På vej mod Annotator Group Bias i Crowdsourcing', 'hr': 'Prema Annotator Group Bias u Crowdsourcing', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu Annotator Group Bias im Crowdsourcing', 'id': 'Menuju kesalahan Grup Annotator dalam Crowdsourcing', 'ko': '패키지 중의 주석자 집단 편견', 'fa': 'به سمت گروه\u200cهای نویسنده\u200cکننده\u200cها در Crowdsourcing', 'sw': 'sourcering', 'tr': 'Duruz', 'af': 'Gaan na Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'sq': 'Për bllokimin e grupit të anotatorëve në crowdsourcing', 'am': 'sourcering', 'hy': 'Անտորատորների խմբի դժվարությունների ուղղությամբ', 'az': 'Crowdsourcing', 'bn': 'sourcering', 'bs': 'Prema Annotator Group Bias u Crowdsourcing', 'ca': 'Towards Annotator Group Bias in Crowdsourcing', 'et': 'Annotator Group kallakud ühisturunduses', 'fi': 'Kohti annotatoriryhmän näkemystä joukkomarkkinoinnissa', 'cs': 'K předsudkům skupiny Annotátorů v crowdsourcingu', 'he': 'לכיוון סבלנות קבוצת העיתונים ב Crowdsourcing', 'jv': 'undo-type', 'sk': 'K skupinski pristranskosti pri množičnem izobraževanju', 'ha': 'sourceing', 'bo': 'Crowdsourcing ནང་དུ་Annotator Group Bias'}
{'en': 'Although transformers are remarkably effective for many tasks, there are some surprisingly easy-looking regular languages that they struggle with. Hahn shows that for languages where acceptance depends on a single input symbol, a transformer’s classification decisions get closer and closer to random guessing (that is, a cross-entropy of 1) as input strings get longer and longer. We examine this limitation using two languages: PARITY, the language of bit strings with an odd number of 1s, and FIRST, the language of bit strings starting with a 1. We demonstrate three ways of overcoming the limitation implied by Hahn’s lemma. First, we settle an open question by constructing a transformer that recognizes PARITY with perfect accuracy, and similarly for FIRST. Second, we use layer normalization to bring the cross-entropy of both models arbitrarily close to zero. Third, when transformers need to focus on a single position, as for FIRST, we find that they can fail to generalize to longer strings; we offer a simple remedy to this problem that also improves length generalization in machine translation.', 'ar': 'برز التعهيد الجماعي كنهج شائع لجمع البيانات المشروحة لتدريب نماذج التعلم الآلي الخاضعة للإشراف. ومع ذلك ، يمكن أن يؤدي انحياز المُضيف التوضيحي إلى التعليقات التوضيحية المعيبة. على الرغم من وجود عدد قليل من الأعمال التي تبحث في تحيز المُضيف التوضيحي الفردي ، إلا أنه يتم تجاهل تأثيرات المجموعة في التعليقات التوضيحية إلى حد كبير. في هذا العمل ، نكشف أن المعلقين في نفس المجموعة الديموغرافية يميلون إلى إظهار تحيز مجموعة متسق في مهام التعليقات التوضيحية ، وبالتالي نجري دراسة أولية حول تحيز مجموعة التعليقات التوضيحية. نتحقق أولاً تجريبيًا من وجود تحيز مجموعة التعليقات التوضيحية في مجموعات بيانات التعهيد الجماعي المتنوعة في العالم الحقيقي. بعد ذلك ، قمنا بتطوير إطار عمل رسومي احتمالي جديد GroupAnno لالتقاط تحيز مجموعة التعليقات التوضيحية باستخدام خوارزمية تعظيم التوقعات الموسعة (EM). نجري تجارب على مجموعات البيانات التركيبية والواقعية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية فعالية نموذجنا في نمذجة تحيز مجموعة التعليقات التوضيحية في تجميع الملصقات ونموذج التعلم عبر خطوط الأساس التنافسية.', 'pt': 'O crowdsourcing surgiu como uma abordagem popular para coletar dados anotados para treinar modelos de aprendizado de máquina supervisionados. No entanto, o viés do anotador pode levar a anotações defeituosas. Embora existam alguns trabalhos investigando o viés de anotadores individuais, os efeitos de grupo em anotadores são amplamente ignorados. Neste trabalho, revelamos que os anotadores dentro do mesmo grupo demográfico tendem a apresentar um viés de grupo consistente em tarefas de anotação e, assim, realizamos um estudo inicial sobre o viés do grupo de anotadores. Primeiro verificamos empiricamente a existência de viés de grupo de anotadores em vários conjuntos de dados de crowdsourcing do mundo real. Em seguida, desenvolvemos uma nova estrutura gráfica probabilística GroupAnno para capturar o viés do grupo de anotadores com um algoritmo estendido de Maximização de Expectativas (EM). Conduzimos experimentos em conjuntos de dados sintéticos e do mundo real. Os resultados experimentais demonstram a eficácia do nosso modelo na modelagem do viés do grupo de anotadores na agregação de rótulos e no aprendizado do modelo sobre as linhas de base competitivas.', 'es': 'El crowdsourcing se ha convertido en un enfoque popular para recopilar datos anotados para entrenar modelos de aprendizaje automático supervisado. Sin embargo, el sesgo del anotador puede provocar anotaciones defectuosas. Aunque hay algunos trabajos que investigan el sesgo de anotadores individuales, los efectos de grupo en los anotadores se pasan por alto en gran medida. En este trabajo, revelamos que los anotadores dentro del mismo grupo demográfico tienden a mostrar un sesgo grupal consistente en las tareas de anotación y, por lo tanto, realizamos un estudio inicial sobre el sesgo grupal de anotadores. Primero verificamos empíricamente la existencia de un sesgo grupal de anotadores en varios conjuntos de datos de crowdsourcing del mundo real. Luego, desarrollamos un novedoso marco gráfico probabilístico GroupAnno para capturar el sesgo del grupo de anotadores con un algoritmo extendido de maximización de expectativas (EM). Llevamos a cabo experimentos en conjuntos de datos sintéticos y del mundo real. Los resultados experimentales demuestran la eficacia de nuestro modelo para modelar el sesgo del grupo de anotadores en la agregación de etiquetas y el aprendizaje de modelos sobre líneas de base competitivas.', 'fr': "Le crowdsourcing est devenu une approche populaire pour collecter des données annotées afin de former des modèles d'apprentissage automatique supervisés. Cependant, le biais des annotations peut entraîner des annotations défectueuses. Bien qu'il existe quelques travaux sur le biais des annotateurs individuels, les effets de groupe dans les annotateurs sont largement négligés. Dans ce travail, nous révélons que les annotateurs d'un même groupe démographique ont tendance à présenter un biais de groupe constant dans les tâches d'annotation et nous menons donc une première étude sur le biais du groupe d'annotateurs. Nous vérifions d'abord empiriquement l'existence d'un biais de groupe d'annotateurs dans divers ensembles de données de crowdsourcing réel. Ensuite, nous développons un nouveau cadre graphique probabiliste GroupAnno pour capturer le biais du groupe d'annotateurs avec un algorithme de maximisation des attentes (EM) étendu. Nous menons des expériences sur des ensembles de données synthétiques et réels. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent l'efficacité de notre modèle pour modéliser le biais du groupe d'annotateurs dans l'agrégation d'étiquettes et l'apprentissage du modèle par rapport à des références concurrentielles.", 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングは、注釈付きデータを収集して監督下の機械学習モデルを訓練するための一般的なアプローチとして登場しています。 しかし、注釈者の偏見は欠陥のある注釈につながる可能性があります。 個々の注釈者の偏見を調査する著作はいくつかあるが、注釈者のグループ効果はほとんど見落とされている。 この研究では、同じ人口統計グループ内の注釈者が注釈タスクで一貫したグループバイアスを示す傾向があることを明らかにし、注釈者グループバイアスに関する初期研究を実施している。 私たちはまず、様々な現実のクラウドソーシングデータセットにおけるアノテーショングループバイアスの存在を実証的に検証します。 次に、拡張された期待最大化（ EM ）アルゴリズムを使用してアノテーショングループのバイアスをキャプチャするための新規の確率的グラフィカルフレームワークGroupAnnoを開発します。 私たちは、合成データセットと現実のデータセットの両方で実験を行います。 実験結果は、ラベルアグリゲーションにおけるアノテーショングループバイアスのモデリングにおける当社のモデルの有効性と、競合ベースラインに対するモデル学習を実証しています。', 'hi': 'Crowdsourcing पर्यवेक्षित मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एनोटेटेड डेटा एकत्र करने के लिए एक लोकप्रिय दृष्टिकोण के रूप में उभरा है। हालांकि, एनोटेटर पूर्वाग्रह दोषपूर्ण एनोटेशन का कारण बन सकता है। हालांकि व्यक्तिगत एनोटेटर पूर्वाग्रह की जांच करने वाले कुछ काम हैं, एनोटेटर में समूह प्रभाव ों को काफी हद तक अनदेखा किया जाता है। इस काम में, हम बताते हैं कि एक ही जनसांख्यिकीय समूह के भीतर एनोटेटर एनोटेशन कार्यों में लगातार समूह पूर्वाग्रह दिखाते हैं और इस प्रकार हम एनोटेटर समूह पूर्वाग्रह पर एक प्रारंभिक अध्ययन करते हैं। हम पहले अनुभवजन्य रूप से विभिन्न वास्तविक दुनिया के क्राउडसोर्सिंग डेटासेट में एनोटेटर समूह पूर्वाग्रह के अस्तित्व को सत्यापित करते हैं। फिर, हम एक विस्तारित अपेक्षा अधिकतमकरण (EM) एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ annotator समूह पूर्वाग्रह पर कब्जा करने के लिए एक उपन्यास संभाव्य ग्राफिकल फ्रेमवर्क GroupAnno विकसित करते हैं। हम सिंथेटिक और वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट दोनों पर प्रयोग करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रतिस्पर्धी आधार रेखाओं पर लेबल एकत्रीकरण और मॉडल सीखने में मॉडलिंग एनोटेटर समूह पूर्वाग्रह में हमारे मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Краудсорсинг стал популярным подходом к сбору аннотированных данных для обучения контролируемых моделей машинного обучения. Тем не менее, смещение аннотатора может привести к дефектным аннотациям. Несмотря на то, что существует несколько работ, в которых исследуется смещение отдельных аннотаторов, групповые эффекты в аннотаторах в значительной степени упускаются из виду. В этой работе мы обнаруживаем, что аннотаторы в рамках одной демографической группы, как правило, демонстрируют последовательную групповую предвзятость в задачах аннотации, и поэтому мы проводим первоначальное исследование групповой предвзятости аннотатора. Сначала мы эмпирически проверяем наличие группового смещения аннотаторов в различных наборах данных для краудсорсинга в реальном мире. Затем мы разрабатываем новую вероятностную графическую структуру GroupAnno для захвата смещения группы аннотаторов с помощью расширенного алгоритма максимизации ожиданий (EM). Мы проводим эксперименты как на синтетических, так и на реальных наборах данных. Экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют эффективность нашей модели в моделировании смещения группы аннотаторов в агрегации этикеток и обучении модели над конкурентными базовыми линиями.', 'zh': '众包已为流行之法,以练带注之数机器习模范。 然注器偏差,或致缺陷。 虽有治单注者偏差之事,而注器中群体之效,其效被忽视多矣。 于此之中,同人会计组中注者倾于注职,故于器组偏差也。 先验诸现实世界众包数据集注者群偏倚。 然后开一新概率图形框架GroupAnno,以广期最大化(EM)算法获注器组偏差。 合数集上实验。 实验验吾形之聚会与模之注器组偏建模之有效性。', 'ga': 'Tháinig slua-fhoinsiú chun cinn mar chur chuige coitianta chun sonraí anótáilte a bhailiú chun samhlacha meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe a oiliúint. Mar sin féin, is féidir nótaí lochtacha a bheith mar thoradh ar laofacht anótaire. Cé go bhfuil roinnt saothar a dhéanann imscrúdú ar chlaonadh anótálaithe aonair, is beag aird a thugtar ar éifeachtaí grúpa anótálaithe. San obair seo, nochtaimid go mbíonn claonadh ag anóadóirí laistigh den ghrúpa déimeagrafach céanna claonadh grúpa comhsheasmhach a léiriú i dtascanna anótála agus mar sin déanaimid staidéar tosaigh ar chlaonadh grúpa anótálaithe. Deimhnímid go heimpíreach ar dtús go bhfuil laofacht grúpa anótálaithe ann i dtacar sonraí slua-fhoinsithe éagsúla den fhíorshaol. Ansin, forbróimid creat grafach dóchúlachtach nua GroupAnno chun laofacht grúpa anótairí a ghabháil le algartam sínte um Uasmhéadú Ionchais (EM). Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacair shonraí shintéiseacha agus fhíorshaolta araon. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha éifeachtacht ár múnla maidir le samhaltú laofachta grúpa anótairí i gcomhiomlánú lipéad agus i bhfoghlaim samhlacha thar bhunlínte iomaíocha.', 'ka': 'Crowdsourcing იქნება როგორც პოლიპური პროგრამა, როგორც მოწყობილობული მონაცემების კოლექციაში მონაცემების შემწავლობა მაქინის სწავლების მოდელების შე მაგრამ, ანტოტორის წარმოდგენება შეიძლება გადავიწყენოთ დეფექტიური ანტოციების შესახებ. მაგრამ არსებობს რამდენიმე სამუშაო სამუშაო, რომელიც ინდიველური ანტოტოტორის სამუშაოდ, ჯგუფის ეფექტი ანტოტორიების უფრო მეტი გადარჩ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ასტოტორიები ერთი დემოგრაფიკური ჯგუფი შორის წინასწორებული ჯგუფის წინასწორებულ წინასწორებულების წინასწორებაში ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, და ამიტომ ჩვენ და ჩვენ პირველი ემპერიკურად დავწერეთ, რომ არატორის ჯგუფის წარმოდგენება განსხვავებული რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების მონაცემებში. შემდეგ, ჩვენ პრომენტიკური პრობლემისტიკური გრაფიკალური ფრამეტრი გრამეტრი GroupAnno განვითარებთ, რომელიც ანოტოტორის ჯგუფის წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენებით გავაკეთებთ გაფართ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები სინტეტიკური და რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესახებ გავაკეთებთ. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მოდელის ეფექტიურობა მოდელის მოდელისთვის მოდელისთვის ანოტოტორის ჯგუფის წარმოდგენების ადგრეგიაციაში და მოდელისთვის', 'hu': 'A crowdsourcing népszerű megközelítésként jelent meg a jegyzetelt adatok gyűjtésében a felügyelt gépi tanulási modellek képzéséhez. A megjegyzések elfogultsága azonban hibás megjegyzésekhez vezethet. Bár van néhány munka, amely az egyes kommentátorok elfogultságát vizsgálja, a kommentátorok csoporthatásait nagyrészt figyelmen kívül hagyják. Ebben a munkában feltárjuk, hogy ugyanazon demográfiai csoporton belüli kommentátorok általában konzisztens csoportelfogultságot mutatnak a kommentátorok feladatokban, ezért kezdeti tanulmányt végzünk a kommentátorcsoportok elfogultságáról. Először empirikusan ellenőrizzük, hogy a különböző valós közösségi adatkészletekben léteznek-e kommentátorcsoportok elfogultságok. Ezt követően kidolgozunk egy új valószínűségi GroupAnno grafikus keretrendszert, amely egy kiterjesztett Expectation Maximization (EM) algoritmussal rögzíti a kommentátorcsoportok elfogultságát. Kísérleteket végzünk szintetikus és valós adatkészleteken egyaránt. Kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják modellünk hatékonyságát a címkeaggregáció és modelltanulás modellezésében a kommentátorcsoportok elfogultságának modellezésében a versenyképes alapvonalakon.', 'el': 'Η Crowdsourcing έχει αναδειχθεί ως μια δημοφιλής προσέγγιση για τη συλλογή σχολιασμένων δεδομένων για την εκπαίδευση εποπτευόμενων μοντέλων μηχανικής μάθησης. Ωστόσο, η προκατάληψη σχολιαστών μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε ελαττωματικά σχόλια. Αν και υπάρχουν μερικά έργα που ερευνούν την επιμέρους προκατάληψη σχολιαστών, τα ομαδικά αποτελέσματα στους σχολιαστές παραβλέπονται σε μεγάλο βαθμό. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αποκαλύπτουμε ότι οι σχολιαστές εντός της ίδιας δημογραφικής ομάδας τείνουν να παρουσιάζουν συνεπή προκατάληψη ομάδας σε εργασίες σχολιασμού και έτσι διεξάγουμε μια αρχική μελέτη σχετικά με την προκατάληψη ομάδας σχολιαστών. Αρχικά επαληθεύουμε εμπειρικά την ύπαρξη προκατάληψης ομάδας σχολιαστών σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων του πραγματικού κόσμου. Στη συνέχεια, αναπτύσσουμε ένα νέο πιθανό γραφικό πλαίσιο για να συλλάβουμε προκατάληψη ομάδας σχολιαστών με έναν εκτεταμένο αλγόριθμο μεγιστοποίησης προσδοκιών (ΕΜ). Διεξάγουμε πειράματα τόσο σε συνθετικά όσο και σε πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του μοντέλου μας στη μοντελοποίηση της προκατάληψης ομάδων σχολιαστών στη συγκέντρωση ετικετών και τη μάθηση μοντέλων πάνω από ανταγωνιστικές γραμμές βάσης.', 'it': "Il crowdsourcing è emerso come un approccio popolare per la raccolta di dati annotati per formare modelli di machine learning supervisionati. Tuttavia, la polarizzazione degli annotatori può portare a annotazioni difettose. Anche se ci sono alcuni lavori che indagano il bias individuale degli annotatori, gli effetti di gruppo negli annotatori sono in gran parte trascurati. In questo lavoro, riveliamo che gli annotatori all'interno dello stesso gruppo demografico tendono a mostrare un bias di gruppo coerente nelle attività di annotazione e quindi conduciamo uno studio iniziale sulla bias di gruppo di annotatori. Verifichiamo in primo luogo empiricamente l'esistenza di bias di gruppo di annotatori in vari dataset di crowdsourcing del mondo reale. Successivamente, sviluppiamo un nuovo framework grafico probabilistico GroupAnno per catturare la polarizzazione dei gruppi di annotatori con un algoritmo esteso di massimizzazione delle aspettative (EM). Conduciamo esperimenti su set di dati sintetici e reali. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro modello nella modellazione dei bias dei gruppi di annotatori nell'aggregazione delle etichette e nell'apprendimento dei modelli rispetto alle linee di base competitive.", 'lt': 'Visuomenės ištekliai pasirodė kaip populiarus metodas rinkti anotuotus duomenis, kad būtų mokomi prižiūrimi mašinų mokymosi modeliai. Vis dėlto anotatorių nuokrypis gali sukelti klaidingas anotacijas. Nors yra keletas darbų, kuriuose tiriamas atskirų anotatorių sąmoningumas, grupinis poveikis anotatorių poveikis iš esmės nepaisomas. Šiame darbe atskleidžiame, kad tos pačios demografinės grupės anotatoriai dažnai rodo nuoseklią grupinę nuokrypį anotacijos užduotyse ir todėl atliekame pradinį tyrimą anotatorių grupės nuokrypį. Pirmiausia empiriniu būdu tikriname, ar egzistuoja anotatorių grupės nuokrypis įvairiuose realaus pasaulio visuomenės išteklių duomenų rinkiniuose. Tuomet sukūrėme naują probabilistinę grafinę sistemą GrupėAnno, kad užfiksuotume anotatorių grupės nuokrypius išplėstiniu lūkesčių maksimalizavimo (EM) algoritmu. We conduct experiments on both synthetic and real-world datasets.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo mūsų modelio veiksmingumą modeliuojant anotatorių grupių pusiausvyrą etiketės suvestinėje ir modelio mokymosi srityje, palyginti su konkurencinėmis bazinėmis linijomis.', 'kk': 'Құрылғы құрылғысы механикалық оқыту үлгілерін оқыту үшін белгіленген деректерді жинау үшін көпшілік тәртібі болды. Бірақ, жаңалықтардың белгісі келмейтін жаңалықтарды таңдауға болады. Бір-бір жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа жаңа белгілерді зерттеу үшін бірнеше жұмыс бар, бірақ белгілердің топтың эффекттері көпшілігінен қалған. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бір демографиялық тобындағы жаңалықтарды жаңалықтардың тапсырмаларында тұрақты топтарды көрсетуге көмектеседі, сондықтан біз жаңалықтарды жаңалықтардың топтардың алдындағы зерттеу Біз біріншіден әлемдегі көпшілік көпшіліктер тобының көпшілігін тексереміз. Содан кейін, біз романдық ықтималдық графикалық фрейкше қоршау GroupAnno- ды жаңартушылар тобының көзгертілген көзгерту (EM) алгоритмімен түсіру үшін жаңартушылар тобының көзгерті Біз синтетикалық және шын әлемдегі деректер қорларында эксперименттерді жасаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің моделігін жазбалар тобының сәйкестігін жазбалардың сәйкестігін жазбалардың сәйкестігін және жазбалардың негізгі', 'ml': 'ക്രൌഡ്സോര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ശ്രദ്ധിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി മെഷ എന്നാലും അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പാഴാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും. കുറച്ച് ജോലികളുണ്ടെങ്കിലും വ്യക്തിപരമായ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നതാണെങ്കിലും, അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രങ്ങളില ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഒരേ ജനംഗ്രാഫിക് കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള അഭിപ്രായം കാണിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ഒരുപാട് കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പ് നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം വിവിധ രീതിയിലെ ലോകത്തെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥി പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഗ്രാഫിക്കല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് ഗ്രൂപ്പ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dത്തിക്കും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ലേബിള്\u200dഗ്രൂപ്പിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തിലും മോഡല', 'mk': 'Популарниот пристап за собирање на анотирани податоци за обука на надгледувани модели на машинско учење се појави. Сепак, пристрасноста на анотаторот може да доведе до недостасувачки анотации. И покрај тоа што постојат неколку работи кои истражуваат индивидуални предрасуди на анотаторите, групните ефекти во анотаторите се претежно заборавени. Во оваа работа откриваме дека анотаторите во истата демографска група имаат тенденција да покажат константни групни предрасуди во задачите за анотација и така спроведуваме иницијална студија на предрасудите на групата за анотатори. Прво емпирички верификуваме дека постои пристрасност на групата на анотатори во различни компјутери на податоци за пулсорсирање во реалниот свет. Потоа, развиваме нова веројатна графичка рамка ГрупаAnno за да го фатиме навредувањето на групата на анотатори со проширен алгоритм на Максимизација на очекување (EM). Правиме експерименти на синтетички и реални податоци. Експерименталните резултати ја демонстрираат ефикасноста на нашиот модел во моделирањето на пристрасноста на групата на анотатори во агрегацијата на етикетите и учењето на моделите над конкурентните основни линии.', 'ms': 'Crowdsourcing telah muncul sebagai pendekatan populer untuk mengumpulkan data anotasi untuk melatih model pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi. Namun, bias annotator boleh menyebabkan anotasi yang cacat. Though there are a few works investigating individual annotator bias, the group effects in annotators are largely overlooked.  Dalam kerja ini, kami mengungkapkan bahawa penganotator dalam kumpulan demografik yang sama cenderung menunjukkan bias kumpulan konsisten dalam tugas annotasi dan oleh itu kami melakukan kajian awal tentang bias kumpulan annotator. Kami pertama-tama secara empirik mengesahkan keberadaan bias kumpulan annotator dalam pelbagai set data crowdsourcing dunia nyata. Kemudian, kami mengembangkan rangkaian grafik probabilistik baru GroupAnno untuk menangkap bias kumpulan annotator dengan algoritma Maximization Expectation (EM) yang lanjut. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data sintetik dan dunia nyata. Keputusan percubaan menunjukkan keefektivitas model kita dalam modelkan bias kumpulan annotator dalam agregasi label dan pembelajaran model melalui garis dasar kompetitif.', 'mt': 'Il-crowdsourcing ħareġ bħala approċċ popolari għall-ġbir ta’ dejta annotata biex jitħarrġu mudelli ta’ tagħlim bil-magni sorveljati. Madankollu, il-preġudizzju tal-annotatur jista’ jwassal għal annotazzjonijiet difettużi. Għalkemm hemm ftit xogħlijiet li jinvestigaw il-preġudizzju individwali tal-annotaturi, l-effetti tal-grupp fl-annotaturi huma fil-biċċa l-kbira injorati. F’dan ix-xogħol, niżvelaw li l-annotaturi fl-istess grupp demografiku għandhom it-tendenza li juru preġudizzju konsistenti tal-grupp fil-kompiti ta’ annotazzjoni u għalhekk nagħmlu studju inizjali dwar preġudizzju tal-grupp ta’ annotaturi. L-ewwel nett tivverifika empirikament l-eżistenza ta’ preġudizzju tal-grupp ta’ annotaturi f’diversi settijiet ta’ dejta dwar crowdsourcing fid-dinja reali. Imbagħad, niżviluppaw qafas grafiku probabilistiku ġdid GruppAnno biex inqabdu l-preġudizzju tal-grupp tal-annotaturi b’algoritmu estiż tal-Massimizzazzjoni tal-Espettazzjoni (EM). Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti kemm fuq settijiet ta’ dejta sintetiċi kif ukoll fuq settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru l-effettività tal-mudell tagħna fl-immudellar tal-preġudizzju tal-grupp tal-annotaturi fl-aggregazzjoni tat-tikketti u t-tagħlim tal-mudell fuq linji bażi kompetittivi.', 'mn': 'Машин суралцах загваруудыг удирдлагатай машин суралцах загваруудыг цуглуулахын тулд олон хүн төрөлхтний арга загвар болсон. Гэвч сэтгэл хөдлөл сэтгэл хөдлөл нөлөөлөх боломжтой. Хэдийгээр хэд хэдэн ажиллагаа зарим хүмүүс өөрсдийнхөө сэтгэл хөдлөлийг судалж байгаа ч, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үр дүнг ихэнхдээ хамаарна. Энэ ажлын дараа бид ижил демографик бүлгийн хүмүүсийн тухай анзаарагчдын тухай анзаарагчдын тухай анзаарагчдын тухай анхны судалгаа хийдэг. Эхлээд бид олон бодит ертөнцийн хүмүүсийн сэргээх өгөгдлийн сангуудын эсрэг байдлыг баталж байна. Дараа нь бид шинэ магадлал график хэлбэрийг GroupAnno-ын хувьд нэмэгдүүлэх хэлбэрийн тухай нэмэгдүүлэх боломж олгодог. Бид синтетик болон бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтыг хийдэг. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загварын үр дүнг нь тэмцэх багийн загварын загварын загварын үр дүнтэй харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Crowdsourcing har oppstått som eit populært tilnærming for å samla oppmerkte data for å trena superviserte maskinelæringsmodeller. Merkelappføring kan imidlertid føre til defektive merknader. Selv om det finst nokre arbeidar som undersøker individuelle merknader, er gruppeeffektane i merknader stort oversikt over. I denne arbeiden viser vi at annotatorar i samme demografiske gruppe tenderer å visa konsistent gruppeforsikt i notasjonsoppgåver, og derfor gjer vi ein opphavsreduksjon om annotator-gruppeforsikt. Vi prøver først empirisk om eksisterende av oppmerkingsgruppa i ulike datasett for verkeleg populasjon. Så utviklar vi eit nytt sannsynlig grafisk rammeverktøygruppeAnno for å ta opp annotator-gruppeforsikt med ein utvida forstørringsgruppe (EM) algoritme. Vi gjev eksperimenter på både syntetiske og verdsdatasett. Eksperimentale resultat demonstrerer effektiviteten av modellen vårt i modellen av oppmerkingsgrupper i merkelaggregasjon og modellen for å lære over konkurentære baselinjer.', 'pl': 'Crowdsourcing stał się popularnym podejściem do gromadzenia adnotacji danych w celu szkolenia nadzorowanych modeli uczenia maszynowego. Jednak uprzedzenie adnotatora może prowadzić do wadliwych adnotacji. Chociaż istnieje kilka prac badających indywidualne uprzedzenia adnotatorów, efekty grupowe w adnotatorach są w dużej mierze pomijane. W niniejszej pracy ujawniamy, że adnotatory w ramach tej samej grupy demograficznej mają tendencję do wykazywania spójnego uprzedzenia grupowego w zadaniach adnotacyjnych i dlatego przeprowadzamy wstępne badanie nad uprzedzeniami grupy adnotatorów. Najpierw empirycznie weryfikujemy istnienie uprzedzeń grupy annotatorów w różnych zbiorach danych crowdsourcingowych w świecie rzeczywistym. Następnie opracowujemy nowy prawdopodobieństwo graficzny framework GroupAnno, aby uchwycić stronniczość grupy adnotatorów z rozszerzonym algorytmem maksymalizacji oczekiwań (EM). Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty zarówno na syntetycznych, jak i rzeczywistych zbiorach danych. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują skuteczność naszego modelu w modelowaniu uprzedzeń grup anotatorów w agregacji etykiet i uczeniu się modeli nad konkurencyjnymi liniami bazowymi.', 'ro': 'Crowdsourcing-ul a apărut ca o abordare populară pentru colectarea datelor adnotate pentru a instrui modele de învățare automată supravegheate. Cu toate acestea, părtinirea adnotatorului poate duce la adnotări defecte. Deși există câteva lucrări care investighează părtinirea adnotatorilor individuali, efectele de grup din adnotatori sunt în mare măsură trecute cu vederea. În această lucrare, dezvăluim că adnotatorii din cadrul aceluiași grup demografic tind să prezinte o părtinire consecventă a grupului în sarcinile de adnotare și, astfel, efectuăm un studiu inițial privind părtinirea grupului adnotatorilor. Verificăm mai întâi empiric existența părtinirii grupurilor de adnotatori în diferite seturi de date crowdsourcing din lumea reală. Apoi, dezvoltăm un nou cadru grafic probabilistic GroupAnno pentru a capta polarizarea grupului de adnotatori cu un algoritm extins de Maximizare a Așteptărilor (EM). Realizăm experimente atât pe seturi de date sintetice, cât și pe cele reale. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează eficacitatea modelului nostru în modelarea părtinirii grupurilor de adnotatori în agregarea etichetelor și învățarea modelului față de liniile de bază competitive.', 'sr': 'Crowdsourcing se pojavio kao popularan pristup skupljanju annotiranih podataka za obuku modela učenja nadzornih strojeva. Međutim, annotatorska predrasuda može dovesti do defektivnih annotacija. Iako ima nekoliko poslova koji istražuju individualne annotatorske predrasude, grupske efekte u annotatorima su uglavnom pregledane. U ovom poslu otkrivamo da annotatori u istoj demografskoj grupi pokazuju konsekventnu predrasude grupe u zadatkima za annotaciju i tako vodimo početnu studiju o predrasude grupe annotatora. Prvo smo empirički potvrdili postojanje pristrasnosti grupe annotatora u različitim podacima o gužvi u stvarnom svijetu. Onda razvijemo nova verovatnoća grafička okvira GroupAnno kako bi uhvatili predrasude grupe annotatora sa proširenim algoritmom za maksimalizaciju očekivanja (EM). Vodimo eksperimente na sintetičkim i realnim podacima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela u modeliranju pristrasnosti grupe annotatora u agregaciji etiketa i modelu učenja nad konkurentnim osnovnim linijama.', 'so': 'Crowdsourcing waxaa u soo baxay qaab maaruf ah oo loo soo ururiyo macluumaad la xumeeyey si ay u tababarido modellada waxbarashada machine la ilaaliyo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka ku qasabka ah wuxuu sababi karaa dhibaatooyin laxaad la’aan ah. Inta kastoo ay jiraan shaqo yar oo ka baaraandegista tababarada qof oo kaliya, waxaa laga eegaa saamaynta kooxaha ka mid ah kuwa dhibaataysan. Shaqadaas waxaynu muujinnaa in dadka ku takoorsada kooxda isku mid ah ay ka muujiyaan qayb isku mid ah oo ka mid ah hawlaha sharafta, sidaas darteed waxaynu sameynaa waxbarasho bilowga ah oo ku saabsan tababarada kooxda. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu si fiican ugu xaqiijinnaa inay jiraan kooxda caddeynta ee guud ee caalamiga ah oo kala duduwan taariikhda. Markaas waxaynu horumarinaynaa warqad sawir ah oo laga yaabaa in loo qabsado koox ka mid ah waxa uu ku qoran yahay kalgorithm dheer Expectation Maximization (EM). Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaanka labada macluumaad ee caalamiga ah Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda saameynta modellkayaga tusaale ahaan u sameynta kooxda tababaridda iyo barashada muusikada ku saabsan saldhigyada iskutarada.', 'sv': 'Crowdsourcing har framkommit som ett populärt tillvägagångssätt för insamling av kommenterade data för att utbilda övervakade maskininlärningsmodeller. Dock kan kommentatorbias leda till felaktiga anteckningar. Även om det finns några verk som undersöker enskilda kommentatorbias förbises gruppeffekterna i kommentatorer till stor del. I detta arbete avslöjar vi att kommentatorer inom samma demografiska grupp tenderar att visa konsekvent gruppbias i kommenteringsuppgifter och därför genomför vi en inledande studie om kommentatorgruppbias. Vi verifierar först empiriskt förekomsten av kommentatorgruppbias i olika reala crowdsourcing datauppsättningar. Sedan utvecklar vi ett nytt probabilistiskt grafiskt ramverk GroupAnno för att fånga kommentatorgruppens bias med en utökad Expectation Maximization (EM) algoritm. Vi utför experiment på både syntetiska och verkliga datauppsättningar. Experimentella resultat visar hur effektiv vår modell är för att modellera kommentatorgruppbias i etikettaggregering och modellinlärning jämfört med konkurrenskraftiga baslinjer.', 'ta': 'க்ரூட்sourceing has emerged as a popular approach for collecting annotated data to collect monitored machine learning models. However, annotator bias can lead to defective annotations.  சில வேலைகள் இருந்தாலும் தனிப்பட்ட அறிவிப்பாளர் பியாஸ் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறது, அறிவிப்பாளர்களின் குழு விளைவு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் வெளிப்படுத்துகிறோம் அதே குழுவில் உள்ள அறிவிப்பாளர்கள் ஒத்திசையான குழுவின் ஒதுங்குப்பாடுகளை அறிவிப்பு பணி நாம் முதலில் வெறுமையாக தெரிந்து கொள்கிறோம் அறிவிப்பாளர் குழு பியாஸ்கள் இருக்கும் என்பதை சரிபார்க்கவும பின்னர், நாம் ஒரு புதிய வரைகலை வரைகலை சட்டத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம் அறிவிப்பாளர் குழுவின் பிரச்சனைகளை விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட எதிர்பார்ப்பு பெரி நாம் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு மற்றும் உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளத்திலும் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம். முயற்சி முடிவு', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරෝඩ්සෝරින්ස් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් වෙනුවෙන් පරික්ෂා කරලා  නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. ඒත් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කියලා තියෙනවා නමුත්, කණ්ඩායම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාල විශ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා එකම ප්\u200dරජාතිකාරණ කණ්ඩායමේ සාමාන්\u200dය කණ්ඩායම් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය කණ්ඩායම් වලට පෙන්වන්න පුළු අපි මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ඊට පස්සේ, අපි ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ග්\u200dරාෆිකල් සංකේතය ග්\u200dරාෆිකල් ග්\u200dරාෆික් ග්\u200dරාෆිකල් ග්\u200dරාෆිකල අපි සින්ටෙටික් සහ ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සේට් එක්ක පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකය කරන්', 'ur': 'کروڈ سورینگ ایک محبوب طریقہ کے طور پر ظاہر ہوگیا ہے کہ ان کے لئے منظور ماشین یادہانی موڈل کو ترین کریں۔ اگرچہ، اڑانے والی بغیر اڑانے والی اڑانے کی وجہ سے پہنچا سکتی ہے. اگرچہ بہت کم کام ہیں جو ایک شخص اذیت دینے والی روش کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، اذیت دینے والوں میں گروپ اثرات بہت زیادہ غفلت کی جاتی ہیں۔ ہم اس کام میں ظاہر کرتے ہیں کہ ایک جماعت گروپ کے درمیان اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اظہار کرنا چاہتے ہیں اور اسی طرح ہم اپنا اظہار گروپ کے بارے میں ایک آغاز اظہار کرتے ہیں۔ ہم پہلے مضبوط طور پر مطمئن کر رہے ہیں کہ مختلف حقیقی دنیا کے گروپ کے منحصر کی موجودگی ہے۔ اس کے بعد ہم نے ایک نو احتمال گرافیک فرم گروپ ایجاد کیا ہے کہ ایک پھیلائی انتظام Maximization (EM) الگوریتم کے ساتھ annotator گروپ کی بحث کو پکڑنے کے لئے. ہم سینٹیسی اور حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش کے نتیجے ہمارے موڈل کی عمدگی کو لابلیٹ جمع اور موڈل کی تعلیم کے ذریعے نمودل گروپ کے مطابق دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, annotator bizlari yomon tadbirlikga ega bo'ladi. Agar bir necha ishlarda bir necha ishlarni bir necha ishlayotgan bo'lsa, annotatorlarning guruh effektlari juda ko'p o'ylab turadi. Bu ishda biz bitta demographik guruhidagi taʼminlovchilar taxminan guruhlarni tashkilotlarda bir qanday bir guruhni ko'rsatadi va shunday qilib biz annotator guruhning qismlariga birinchi taʼminlovchini bajaramiz. Biz birinchi tashkilotni tasdiqlash guruhi boshqa dunyoning jamoatlar tarkibi mavjudligini tasdiqlashimiz mumkin. Anno'ni taʼminlovchi guruhning qismlarini o'rganish uchun, uzun Expected Maximization (EM) algoritni olib tashlashimiz mumkin. Biz syntetik va halik dunyo maʼlumotlar tizimini bajaramiz. Tajriba natijalari modelimizning effektligini taʼminlovchi guruhga taʼminlovchi bo'lishi mumkinligini ko'rsatadi. Moslamalarni taxminan asboblar sohasida o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tập đoàn tụ xuất hiện như một phương pháp phổ biến để thu thập dữ liệu ghi chú để huấn luyện các mô hình học máy giám sát. Tuy nhiên, khuynh hướng ghi chú có thể gây lỗi chú. Mặc dù có một số công việc điều tra sai lệch ngôn ngữ cá nhân, các hiệu ứng nhóm trong nhà ghi âm được bỏ qua. Trong công việc này, chúng ta tiết lộ rằng các nhà biên niên đại trong cùng nhóm dân số có xu hướng xuất hiện khuynh hướng của nhóm trong các công việc ghi chú và chúng ta tiến hành nghiên cứu đầu tiên về khuynh hướng của nhóm nghiên cứu. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi thực nghiệm kiểm tra sự tồn tại khuynh hướng của nhóm nghiên cứu, trong nhiều bộ dữ liệu thế giới thực. Sau đó, chúng tôi phát triển một hệ thống biểu đồ họa mới. GroupAnno to catch thanh chú thích nhóm ưu việt với a extensive Maximation (EM). Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên cả hệ thống dữ liệu tổng hợp và thực tế. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả của mô hình về khuynh hướng sản xuất của nhóm chú thích trong khi tổng hợp nhãn và học mẫu trên nền tảng cạnh tranh.', 'bg': 'Кроудсорсингът се появи като популярен подход за събиране на анотирани данни за обучение на модели за контролирано машинно обучение. Въпреки това, анотаторните отклонения могат да доведат до дефектни анотации. Въпреки че има няколко произведения, изследващи индивидуалните анотаторни пристрастия, груповите ефекти в анотаторите са до голяма степен пренебрегнати. В тази работа разкриваме, че анотаторите в рамките на една и съща демографска група са склонни да показват последователно групово пристрастие в задачите по анотация и по този начин провеждаме първоначално проучване на анотаторните групови пристрастия. Първо емпирично проверяваме съществуването на анотаторни групови пристрастия в различни набори от данни от реалния свят. След това разработваме нова вероятностна графична рамка за улавяне на анотаторни групови отклонения с разширен алгоритъм за максимизиране на очакванията (ЕМ). Провеждаме експерименти върху синтетични и реални набори от данни. Експерименталните резултати демонстрират ефективността на нашия модел при моделиране на анотаторни групови пристрастия при агрегиране на етикети и учене на модели над конкурентни базови линии.', 'hr': 'Crowdsourcing se pojavio kao popularni pristup skupljanju annotiranih podataka za obuku modela učenja nadzornih strojeva. Međutim, annotatorska predrasuda može dovesti do defektivnih annotacija. Iako ima nekoliko poslova koji istražuju pojedinačne pristrasnosti annotator a, učinci grupe u annotatorima su uglavnom pregledani. U ovom poslu otkrivamo da annotatori u istoj demografskoj skupini čine pokazati konsekventne predrasude grupe u zadatkima za annotacije i tako vodimo početno ispitivanje o predrasude grupe annotatora. Prvo smo empirički provjerili postojanje pristrasnosti grupe annotatora u različitim podacima o crowdsourcing podataka u stvarnom svijetu. Onda razvijemo nov vjerojatni grafički okvir GroupAnno kako bi uhvatili predrasude grupe annotator a sa proširenim algoritmom Maximizacije očekivanja (EM). Provodimo eksperimente na sintetičkim i realnim podacima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela u modeliranju pristrasnosti grupe annotatora u aggregaciji etiketa i modelu učenja nad konkurentnim osnovnim linijama.', 'da': 'Crowdsourcing er fremkommet som en populær tilgang til indsamling af annoterede data til at træne overvågede maskinlæringsmodeller. Men annotator bias kan føre til defekte annotationer. Selvom der er nogle få værker, der undersøger individuelle kommentatorbias, er gruppeeffekter i kommentatorer stort set overset. I dette arbejde afslører vi, at kommentatorer inden for samme demografiske gruppe har tendens til at vise konsekvent gruppebias i annotationsopgaver, og derfor gennemfører vi en første undersøgelse af kommentatorgruppebias. Vi verificerer først empirisk eksistensen af kommentatorgruppebias i forskellige crowdsourcing datasæt i virkeligheden. Derefter udvikler vi en ny sandsynlighedsmæssig grafisk ramme GroupAnno til at fange kommentatorgruppebias med en udvidet Expectation Maximization (EM) algoritme. Vi udfører eksperimenter på både syntetiske og virkelige datasæt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser effektiviteten af vores model i modellering af kommentatorgruppebias i etiketaggregering og model læring i forhold til konkurrencedygtige basislinjer.', 'nl': 'Crowdsourcing is uitgegroeid tot een populaire benadering voor het verzamelen van geannoteerde gegevens om begeleide machine learning modellen te trainen. Annotator bias kan echter leiden tot defecte annotaties. Hoewel er een paar werken zijn die individuele annotator bias onderzoeken, worden de groepseffecten in annotatoren grotendeels over het hoofd gezien. In dit werk laten we zien dat annotatoren binnen dezelfde demografische groep consistente groepsbias vertonen in annotatietaken en daarom voeren we een eerste studie uit naar annotatiegroep bias. We verifiëren eerst empirisch het bestaan van annotatorgroep bias in verschillende real-world crowdsourcing datasets. Vervolgens ontwikkelen we een nieuw probabilistisch grafisch framework GroupAnno om annotatorgroepsbias vast te leggen met een uitgebreid Expectation Maximization (EM) algoritme. We voeren experimenten uit op zowel synthetische als echte datasets. Experimentele resultaten tonen de effectiviteit van ons model aan bij het modelleren van annotatorgroepsbias in labelaggregatie en modellleren boven concurrerende baselines.', 'de': 'Crowdsourcing hat sich als beliebter Ansatz für das Sammeln annotierter Daten zum Trainieren von überwachten Machine Learning Modellen entwickelt. Annotator Bias kann jedoch zu fehlerhaften Annotationen führen. Obwohl es einige Arbeiten gibt, die den individuellen Annotator Bias untersuchen, werden die Gruppeneffekte in Annotatoren weitgehend übersehen. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass Annotatoren innerhalb derselben demografischen Gruppe tendenziell konsistente Gruppenbias in Annotationsaufgaben zeigen. Daher führen wir eine erste Studie zum Annotationsgruppenbias durch. Zunächst verifizieren wir empirisch die Existenz von Annotatorgruppenbias in verschiedenen realen Crowdsourcing-Datensätzen. Anschließend entwickeln wir ein neuartiges probabilistisches grafisches Framework GroupAnno, um Annotatorgruppenbias mit einem erweiterten Algorithmus zur Erwartungsmaximierung (EM) zu erfassen. Wir führen Experimente an synthetischen und realen Datensätzen durch. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen die Effektivität unseres Modells bei der Modellierung von Annotatorgruppenbias bei der Etikettenaggregation und Modelllernen über wettbewerbsfähige Baselines.', 'ko': '크라우드소싱(Crowdsourcing)은 이미 주석이 달린 데이터를 수집하여 감독이 있는 기계 학습 모델을 훈련시키는 데 유행하는 방법이 되었다.그러나 주석자의 편견은 결함이 있는 주석을 초래할 수 있다.일부 주석자의 개체적 편견을 연구하는 저작이 있지만 주석자의 단체 효과는 어느 정도 무시된다.이 작업에서 우리는 같은 인구통계학 그룹의 주석자가 주석 임무에서 종종 일치하는 그룹 편견을 나타내는 것을 발견했기 때문에 우리는 주석자 그룹의 편견에 대해 초보적인 연구를 진행했다.우리는 먼저 각종 진실한 패키지 데이터 집중 주석자 단체의 편견의 존재를 실증적으로 검증했다.그리고 우리는 새로운 확률 도형 프레임워크 그룹애노를 개발하여 확장된 기대 최대화(EM) 알고리즘으로 주석자 그룹의 편차를 포착했다.우리는 합성 데이터 집합과 실제 데이터 집합에서 실험을 진행한다.실험 결과는 우리의 모델이 라벨 집합과 경쟁 기선 모델 학습에서 모델링 주석자 단체 편차의 유효성을 증명했다.', 'id': 'Crowdsourcing telah muncul sebagai pendekatan populer untuk mengumpulkan data anotasi untuk melatih model belajar mesin yang diawasi. Namun, bias annotator bisa menyebabkan anotasi yang salah. Meskipun ada beberapa pekerjaan menyelidiki bias annotator individu, efek kelompok dalam annotator kebanyakan diabaikan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengungkapkan bahwa annotator dalam kelompok demografi yang sama cenderung menunjukkan bias kelompok konsisten dalam tugas annotasi dan sehingga kami melakukan sebuah studi awal tentang bias kelompok annotator. Kami pertama-tama memastikan keberadaan bias kelompok annotator dalam berbagai set data crowdsourcing dunia nyata. Kemudian, kami mengembangkan rangkaian grafis probabilistik baru GroupAnno untuk menangkap bias grup annotator dengan algoritma Expectation Maximization (EM) yang lanjut. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data sintetis dan dunia nyata. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan efektivitas model kita dalam memmodelir bias kelompok annotator dalam agregasi label dan belajar model atas garis dasar kompetitif.', 'sw': 'Vyombo vya Crowdsources vimejitokeza kama njia maarufu ya kukusanya taarifa zilizotajwa ili kufundisha mifano ya kujifunza mashine. Hata hivyo, upendeleo wa uchochezi unaweza kusababisha matatizo yanayopoteza. Pamoja na kuwa kuna kazi chache zinazochunguza upendeleo wa kibaguzi binafsi, madhara ya makundi yanayotokana na matatizo hayo yanaangaliwa sana. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kuwa wachochezi katika kundi hilo la watu wanatendea kuonyesha upendeleo wa kikundi kinachoendelea katika kazi za kusikitisha na hivyo tunafanya utafiti wa mwanzo kuhusu upendeleo wa kundi la wachochezaji. Kwanza tunathibitisha kuwepo kwa makundi ya uchochezi katika seti mbalimbali za taarifa za watu duniani. Kisha, tunatengeneza mradi wa picha wa Kikundi cha GroupAnno ili kukamata upendeleo wa kikundi cha matangazo na utambulisho mkubwa wa Matumaini (EM). Tunafanya majaribio katika takwimu za pamoja na halisi za dunia. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi wa modeli wetu katika kutengeneza upendeleo wa kikundi cha uchochezi katika kutengwa kwa mitandao na kujifunza juu ya misingi ya ushindani.', 'fa': 'Crowdsourcing به عنوان یک دستور محبوب برای جمع داده\u200cهای مشهور برای آموزش مدل یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای نظارت آموزش داده شده است. با این حال، رضایت آشکارگر می\u200cتواند به اظهار ناتوانی برساند. اگرچه چند کاری وجود دارد که تحقیق کنجکاوی آشکارگر شخصی هستند، اثرات گروهی در آشکارگران بسیار فراموش می شوند. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که نویسنده\u200cها در یک گروه دموگرافیک عادت می\u200cکنند که در مسائل نویسنده\u200cهای گروه هماهنگی را نشان می\u200cدهند، و به همین دلیل یک مطالعه اولیه در مورد توجه گروه نویسنده\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهیم. ما اولین بار به صورت امپراطوری وجود گروه آشنا کننده\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای اطلاعات اجتماعی جهان واقعی را ثابت می\u200cکنیم. سپس، ما یک چهارچوب گرافیکی احتمالات جدید را توسعه می\u200cکنیم GroupAnno تا با الگوریتم بزرگترین انتظار (EM) گرافیک گروه آشنا کننده را بگیریم. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی مجموعه\u200cهای سینتاتیک و دنیای واقعی انجام می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای موثرت مدل ما را نشان می\u200cدهند در مدل\u200cسازی پیشرفت گروه\u200cهای آگاهی\u200cکننده در جمع\u200cآوری نقاشی و مدل یادگیری بر پایه\u200cهای مسابقه.', 'sq': 'Shërbimi publik ka dalë si një qasje popullore për mbledhjen e të dhënave të anotuara për të trajnuar modelet e mësimit të mbikqyrur nga makinat. Megjithatë, paragjykimi i anotatorit mund të shpjerë në anotacione të gabuara. Megjithëse ka disa punë që hetojnë paragjykimet e anotatorëve individual ë, efektet e grupit në anotatorët janë kryesisht të harruar. In this work, we reveal that annotators within the same demographic group tend to show consistent group bias in annotation tasks and thus we conduct an initial study on annotator group bias.  Së pari ne verifikojmë empirikisht ekzistencën e paragjykimit të grupit të anotatorëve në grupe të ndryshme të dhënash crowdsourcing në botën reale. Pastaj, ne zhvillojmë një kuadër grafik të ri probabilistik GroupAnno për të kapur paragjykimet e grupit të anotatorëve me një algoritëm të zgjeruar të maksimizimit të pritjes (EM). Ne kryejmë eksperimente në të dhënat sintetike dhe të botës reale. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë efektshmërinë e modelit tonë në modelimin e paragjykimeve të grupit të anotatorëve në agregimin e etiketave dhe mësimin e modelit mbi linjat bazë konkurruese.', 'af': "Crowdsourcing het voorgekom as 'n populêre toegang vir die versamel van notateerde data om superviseerde masjien leer modele te trein. Maar, annotator voorspoedige kan lei na defektiewe notasies. Alhoewel daar 'n paar werke ondersoek individuele annotator voorbeeld, word die groepeffekte in annotators groot oorskou. In hierdie werk, vertoon ons dat annotators binne dieselfde demografiese groep tendeer om konsistente groepvoorbeeld in annotasie opdragte te wys en daarom ons 'n aanvanklike studie op annotator groepvoorbeeld uitvoer. Ons het eerste empiriese bevestig die eksistensie van annotator groepvoorbeeld in verskeie regte wêreld verskeidende datastelle. Dan ontwikkel ons 'n roman waarskynlik grafiese raamwerk groepAnno om annotator groep bias te vang met 'n uitgebreide verwagting Maksimalisasie (EM) algoritme. Ons doen eksperimente op beide sintetiese en regte wêreld datastelle. Eksperimentele resultate vertoon die effektiviteit van ons model in modellering van annotator groepvoorbeeld in etiket aggregasie en model leer oor konkurrentige basisline.", 'tr': 'Pul süýtgetmek isleýän maşyny öwrenmek nusgalaryny okuwçylamak üçin meşhur ýagdaý bolup göründi. Ýöne, täsirli sowgatlar täsirli sözlere getirip biler. Birnäçe täsirli näsazlary barlamak üçin birnäçe eser bar, toplu täsirleri täsirlerde kän bir şekilde üýtgedendir. Bu işde, biz bir demografik grupda yaptığımız anlatıcılar tuhaf durumlarda bir grup bias ını gösterip, bu şekilde başlangıç bir çalışma yaptık. Biz ilkinji gezek, dürli dünýäde crowdsourcing veri setirlerinde nähili täsirler toplumyň biaslarynyň bardygyny barlaýarys. Sonra, biz bir roman mümkinçi grafik çarpaklary groupiň önüne geçirilýän bir gözlenme Maksimasyyla (EM) algoritmi tapmak üçin döredik. Biz sintetik we hakyky dünýä veri setirlerinde deneyler çykýarys. Durmançylyk netijesi biziň modelimiziň täsirleşigini etiket toplanty we model öwrenmesini rekabetçi baseliniň üstünde örän täsirleşigini görkezýär.', 'am': 'Crowdsourcing has emerged as popular approach for collecting data to trained machine learning models. ምንም እንኳን አናስታሪው ብያሽን የደከሙ ጉዳይ ይችላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የአካባቢው ብያሽን ለመመርመርመር ጥቂት ሥራ ቢኖሩ፣ የቡድን ውጤቶች በብዛት ተለይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ በአንድ ዲሞግራፊ ቡድን ውስጥ ያሉት ተቃውሞ የክፍለ ጉዳዮችን ለማሳየት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በመጀመሪያ የዓለማዊ የድምፅ አካባቢ አካባቢ ጉዳይ የሆኑን እናረጋግጣለን፡፡ Anno እና የአሳታተር ጉዳዮችን በተዘጋጀ እውቀት ማድረግ (EM) አልጎሪትምን ለመያዝ የሚችሉትን የግራፊካዊ ፍሬማር እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በምንስታዊ እና እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታተሮች ላይ ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የሞዴላታችንን የኢንተርታተር ቡድን አካባቢ እና ሞዴል በተቃዋሚ መደገፊያዎች ላይ ማምረጥ ጥያቄን ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հանդիսային հարաբերակցությունը հայտնվել է որպես հայտնի մոտեցում գրված տվյալներ հավաքելու համար, որպեսզի վերահսկվող մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մոդելներ սովորեցնեն: Այնուամենայնիվ, նկարագրողների կողմնականությունը կարող է հանգեցնել սխալ նկարագրությունների: Չնայած կան մի քանի աշխատանք, որոնք ուսումնասիրում են անհատական նոտատորների կողմնականությունը, նոտատորների խմբային ազդեցությունները հիմնականում անտեսվում են: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք բացահայտում ենք, որ նոտատորները նույն դեմոգրաֆիկ խմբում հակված են ցույց տալ համապատասխան խմբային կողմնականություն նոտատորների խնդիրների մեջ, և այսպես մենք կատարում ենք նախարդական ուսումնասիրություն նոտատորների խմբի Սկզբում մենք էմպիրիկապես ստուգում ենք annoտորային խմբի կողմնականությունը տարբեր իրական աշխարհի բազմաթիվ տվյալների համակարգերում: Հետո մենք զարգանում ենք նոր հավանական գրաֆիկ խումբ We conduct experiments on both synthetic and real-world datasets.  Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը մոդելավորելով annoտորային խմբի կողմնականությունը պիտակների ագրեգացիայի մեջ և մոդելային ուսումնասիրության մեջ մրցակցության հիմքային գծ', 'bn': 'ক্রাউডসোর্সিং মেশিন শিক্ষা মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য বিরক্ত তথ্য সংগ্রহের জন্য জনপ্রিয় উপায় হিসেবে উঠেছে। তবে বিক্ষোভকারীদের বিরুদ্ধে বিরক্তিকর ব্যাপারে ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হতে পারে। যদিও কিছু কাজ রয়েছে ব্যক্তিগত বিরক্তিকর বিয়াদের তদন্ত করার ব্যাপারে, কিন্তু বিরক্তিকর দলের প্রভাব ব বেশীরভাগ উপেক্ এই কাজে আমরা প্রকাশ করি যে একই গণতান্ত্রিক গ্রুপের মধ্যে বিক্ষোভকারীরা সাধারণ গ্রুপের বিরুদ্ধে বিভ্রান্তিক কাজে প্রদর্শন করে এবং তাই আমর আমরা প্রথমে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভি Then, we develop a novel probabilistic graphical framework GroupAnno to capture annotator group bias with an extended Expectation Maximization (EM) algorithm.  আমরা সিন্টেটিক এবং বাস্তব বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল আমাদের মডেলের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে লেবেলেট গ্রুপের প্রতিযোগিতা এবং মডেলের উপর প্রতিযোগিতা শিক্ষা দেয়।', 'az': "Crowdsourcing, gözləyirlən maşın öyrənmə modellərini təhsil etmək üçün bildirilmiş məlumatları toplamaq üçün popüler bir yol olaraq ortaya çıxdı. Ancaq, annotator bias təsirlərini dəyişdirə bilər. Həqiqətən də, individual annotator təsirlərini incitməyə çalışan bir neçə işlər var, məlumatçıların grup təsirlərinin çox böyük təsiri yoxdur. Bu işdə, biz də belə göstəririk ki, bir demografik qrupunun içindəki annotatorların müəyyən bir qrup təsirlərini göstərməyə çalışırlar. Beləliklə, annotator qrupu təsirlərini ilk təhsil edirik. Biz ilk dəfə müxtəlif reallı dünya qüvvəsi qurbanlıq qurbanlıqlarında annotator qüvvəsi təsirlərinin varlığını təsdiqləyirik. Sonra, biz yeni mümkün olaraq grafik frameworklər GroupAnno'yu uzaqlaşdırmaq üçün çoxlu gözləmə Maksimalizasyonu (EM) algoritmi ilə annotator qrupu bias yakalamaq üçün hazırlamışıq. Biz sintetik və həqiqət dünya veri qurularında təcrübələr edərik. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları modelimizin etiketli toplama və modeli öyrənməsini göstərir.", 'cs': 'Crowdsourcing se stal populárním přístupem ke sběru anotovaných dat pro trénink modelů strojového učení s dohledem. Nicméně, zkreslení anotátoru může vést k vadným anotacím. Ačkoli existuje několik prací zkoumajících individuální anotátorové zaujatosti, skupinové efekty v anotátorech jsou do značné míry přehlíženy. V této práci odhalujeme, že anotátory ve stejné demografické skupině mají tendenci vykazovat konzistentní skupinové zaujatosti v anotacích úkolech, a proto provádíme první studii o anotátorových skupinách. Nejprve empiricky ověřujeme existenci zkreslení anotátorové skupiny v různých skutečných crowdsourcingových datových sadách. Následně vyvíjíme nový pravděpodobnostní grafický rámec GroupAnno pro zachycení zkreslení anotátorové skupiny s rozšířeným algoritmem maximalizace očekávání (EM). Provádíme experimenty na syntetických i reálných datových sadách. Experimentální výsledky demonstrují efektivitu našeho modelu v modelování zkreslení anotátorových skupin při agregaci štítků a učení modelů nad konkurenčními základními liniemi.', 'bs': 'Crowdsourcing se pojavio kao popularan pristup skupljanju annotiranih podataka za treniranje modela učenja nadzornih strojeva. Međutim, annotatorska predrasuda može dovesti do defektivnih annotacija. Iako ima nekoliko poslova koji istražuju individualnu pristrasnost annotator a, grupske učinke u annotatorima su uglavnom pregledane. U ovom poslu otkrivamo da annotatori u istoj demografskoj grupi čine pokazati konsekventne predrasude grupe u zadatkima annotacije i tako vodimo početnu studiju o predrasude grupe annotatora. Prvo smo empirički provjerili postojanje pristrasnosti grupe annotatora u različitim grupama podataka o crowdsourcing realnog svijeta. Onda razvijemo nov vjerojatni grafički okvir GroupAnno kako bi uhvatili predrasude grupe annotator a sa proširenim algoritmom za maksimalizaciju očekivanja (EM). Provodimo eksperimente na sintetičkim i realnim podacima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela u modeliranju pristrasnosti grupe annotatora u aggregaciji etiketa i modelu učenja nad konkurentnim osnovnim linijama.', 'et': 'Ühisturundus on kujunenud populaarseks lähenemisviisiks märgitud andmete kogumisel järelevalvega masinõppe mudelite koolitamiseks. Ometi võib annotatori kalduvus põhjustada defektseid annotatsioone. Kuigi on olemas mõned tööd, milles uuritakse individuaalseid annotatorite kalduvust, on grupiefektid annotatorites suures osas tähelepanuta jäetud. Käesolevas töös näitame, et sama demograafilise rühma annotatorid kipuvad avaldama ühtlast rühma erapooletust annotatsiooniülesannetes ja seega teostame esialgse uuringu annotatorühma erapooletuse kohta. Esmalt kontrollime empiiriliselt annotatorühmade erapooletuse olemasolu erinevates reaalmaailma ühishankimise andmekogumites. Seejärel töötame välja uue tõenäosusliku graafilise raamistiku GroupAnno, et jäädvustada annotatorirühma kallakud laiendatud ootuste maksimeerimise (EM) algoritmiga. Me teeme katseid nii sünteetiliste kui ka reaalsete andmekogumitega. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad meie mudeli efektiivsust märgistuse koondamisel ja mudeli õppimisel konkurentsivõimelistel alusjoonedel.', 'ca': "La crowdsourcing ha sorgit com un enfocament popular per recollir dades anotates per formar models d'aprenentatge màquinari supervisads. Tot i així, el bias dels anotators pot portar a anotacions defectuoses. Encara que hi ha unes quantes feines investigant el bias individual dels anotators, els efectes de grup dels anotators estan sobretot ignorats. En aquesta feina, revelem que els anotators del mateix grup demogràfic tendeixen a mostrar bias de grup consistents en tasques d'anotació i així fem un estudi inicial sobre bias de grup d'anotators. Primer verificem empíricament l'existència de bias en grups d'anotators en diversos conjunts de dades de crowdsourcing del món real. Després desenvolupem un nou quadre gràfic probabilista GroupAnno per capturar el bias del grup d'anotators amb un algoritme estensiu de Maximització d'Espectació (EM). Fem experiments tant en conjunts de dades sintètiques com en el món real. Els resultats experimentals demostren l'eficacia del nostre model en modelar el bias del grup d'anotators en l'agregació d'etiquetes i l'aprenentatge del model sobre les línies de base competitives.", 'fi': 'Joukkorakennus on noussut suosituksi lähestymistavaksi anotoidun datan keräämiseen ohjattujen koneoppimismallien kouluttamiseksi. Huomaattoreiden vino voi kuitenkin johtaa virheellisiin huomautuksiin. Vaikka yksittäisiä annotaattoreiden vinoja tutkitaan muutamassa työssä, ryhmävaikutukset huomioidaan suurelta osin. Tässä työssä paljastetaan, että saman väestöryhmän annotaatorit osoittavat yleensä johdonmukaista ryhmävääristymää annotointitehtävissä, ja näin ollen teemme alustavan tutkimuksen annotaattoriryhmävääristymästä. Vahvistamme ensin empiirisesti huomautusryhmän vinoutumisen eri reaalimaailman joukkoistamisen aineistoissa. Tämän jälkeen kehitämme uuden todennäköisen graafisen viitekehyksen GroupAnno, joka tallentaa annotatoriryhmän viuhoja laajennetulla Expectation Maximization (EM) -algoritmilla. Teemme kokeita sekä synteettisillä että reaalimaailman aineistoilla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat mallimme tehokkuuden merkitsemisryhmäviuhojen mallintamisessa etikettien aggregoinnissa ja mallien oppimisessa kilpailukykyisillä lähtölinjoilla.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Genjer-genjer diulangno sing wis ngerasakno nyong nggawe bias a, efek kelompok nggawe barang-barang. Nang gunggo iki, kita ngerasakno banget gak bener tentang karo nggawe jeneng nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerasakno dadi, dadi kita mulai nggawe mulai nggawe cara-cara nggawe cara-cara nggawe cara nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan ngerasakno dadi sing perusahaan karo cah-cah dadi sing nyimpen Unya, kita nggunakake un barêng sanalistik bukêng nggawe Grup bukêng nggawe jadasar mulasar bias karo un luwih saben nggawe Awaksi maximum (EM) Algorithm. Anyone Rejalaké sing paling nggambar maneh efek ning model sing ngendalikne dadi, iso nggawe barang nggawe gerakan karo model sing nyimpen banget', 'he': 'הציבור הופיע כגישה פופולרית לאספת נתונים מועטפים לאימון מודלים למידע מכונות שמבוטחים. בכל אופן, ההתמחות של המכתבים יכולה להוביל לתכתבות פגומות. למרות שיש כמה עבודות חוקרות חיזוקי ציונים בודדים, השפעות הקבוצות במציונים הם בעיקר מתעלמים. בעבודה הזו, אנו חושפים שמציונים בתוך אותה קבוצה דמוגרפית נוטים להראות חיזוקים קבוצתיים קבועים במשימות ציונים ולכן אנו מבצעים מחקר ראשון על חיזוקים קבוצתיים ציונים. ראשית אנו מאשרים באימפריקה את קיומו של ההתמחות של קבוצת ציונים במערכות מידע מסוימות בעולם האמיתי. ואז, אנחנו מפתחים מסגרת גרפית סיפורית חדשה קבוצתיAnno כדי לתפוס צדיפות קבוצת ציונים עם אלגוריתם מקסימיזציה צפייה מורחבת (EM). אנו מבצעים ניסויים גם על קבוצות נתונים סינטטיים וגם בעולם האמיתי. תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות את היעילות של הדוגמא שלנו בנוגע לדוגמאות ההתמחות של קבוצת ציונים באגרגרציה של תוויות ולמדות דוגמאות מעל קווי בסיס תחרותיים.', 'ha': "@ action: button A lokacin da za'a iya sami sharuya. Haƙĩƙa, kuma da kaɗan masu aikin da suke yin ƙidãya ga masu bastarwa guda, sai an kangara musamman ƙungiyõyi masu cikin matalauta. Daga wannan aikin, muna bayyana cewa masu taƙaita cikin jama'a guda na mutane, suna nuna kibiyoyi mai daidai ga jama'a a cikin aikin taƙaitar taƙaita, kuma don haka tuna karatun ta farko a kan taƙaitãwa na ƙungiya. First of all, we empirically verify the presence of the notitator group bis in several real-world-masssourcing data set. Anno We conduct experiments on both synthetic and real-world datasets.  Matarin jarrabai sun nuna aikin misalinmu a sami-sami-sami-dangane jama'a-yanzu-jama'a cikin taɓa-tagogi da misalin mutane da za'a karanta a a kan basalin tarayya.", 'sk': 'Crowdsourcing se je pojavil kot priljubljen pristop za zbiranje označenih podatkov za usposabljanje nadzorovanih modelov strojnega učenja. Vendar pa lahko pristranskost označevanja povzroči napačne opombe. Čeprav obstaja nekaj del, ki raziskujejo pristranskost posameznih označevalcev, so učinki skupine v označevalcih večinoma spregledani. V tem delu smo razkrili, da so označevalci znotraj iste demografske skupine običajno dosledno skupinsko pristranskost pri nalogah označevanja, zato smo izvedli začetno študijo o pristranskosti skupine označevalcev. Najprej empirično preverimo obstoj pristranskosti skupine opozorilcev v različnih množičnih naborih podatkov v realnem svetu. Nato smo razvili nov verjetnostni grafični okvir GroupAnno za zajem pristranskosti skupine opotatorjev z razširjenim algoritmom povečanja pričakovanj (EM). Izvajamo poskuse na sintetičnih in resničnih naborih podatkov. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo učinkovitost našega modela pri modeliranju pristranskosti skupinskih označevalnikov pri agregaciji oznak in učenju modelov preko konkurenčnih osnovnih linij.', 'bo': 'ཆང་ཆུང་གིས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཆེ་མཐོང་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། འགྲེལ་བཤད་དབང་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཚུགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེའི་རྐྱེན་ལ་བཟོ་ཚོང་ཁང་ལ་བཟུང་བའི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཉུང་ཀུ་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། ཚོ་ཁག་གི་དབུལ་སྡུད་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐ འུ་ཅག་གི་ལཱ་སྟངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་སྒྲུབ ང་ཚོས་འཛམ་གླིང་མི་དངོས་ཡོད་པའི་དབུགས་སྡེར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཅིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ནས་འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསར་བ་སྐྱེལ་གྱིས་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་བྱུང་བ་ཞིག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་ལ། ང་ཚོས་སྦྱོར་དབྱིབས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བརྟག་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མ Experimental results demonstrate the effectiveness of our model in modeling annotater group bias in label aggregation and model learning over competitive baselines.'}
{'en': 'Prediction Difference Regularization against Perturbation for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'تحت العدسة الشكلية: تقييم متعدد الأوجه للتحيز الجنساني في ترجمة الكلام', 'pt': 'Sob a Lente Morfossintática: Uma Avaliação Multifacetada do Viés de Gênero na Tradução de Fala', 'es': 'Bajo la lente morfosintáctica: una evaluación multifacética del sesgo de género en la traducción del habla', 'fr': "Sous l'angle morphosyntaxique\xa0: une évaluation multidimensionnelle des préjugés sexistes dans la traduction de la parole", 'ja': 'Morphosyntactic Lensの下で：音声翻訳におけるジェンダーバイアスの多面的評価', 'zh': '形句法镜头下:语音译中性别偏见者多质', 'hi': 'Morphosyntactic लेंस के तहत: भाषण अनुवाद में लिंग पूर्वाग्रह का एक बहुआयामी मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Под морфосинтаксической линзой: многогранная оценка гендерной предвзятости в переводе речи', 'ga': 'Faoin Lionsa Morphosyntactic: Meastóireacht Ilghnéitheach ar Laofacht Inscne san Aistriúchán Cainte', 'hu': 'A morfoszintatikus lencse alatt: A nemek közötti eltérések sokoldalú értékelése a beszédfordításban', 'el': 'Κάτω από τον Μορφοσυντακτικό φακό: Μια πολύπλευρη αξιολόγηση των προκατάληψης των Φύλων στη μετάφραση ομιλίας', 'it': 'Sotto la lente morfosintattica: una valutazione sfaccettata delle distorsioni di genere nella traduzione vocale', 'ka': 'Morphosyntactic Lens- ის ქვემოთ: მრავალფერი განსაზღვრება Gender Bias- ის განსაზღვრებაში', 'lt': 'Pagal morfosintaksinį lęšiuką: daugialypis lyčių sutrikimų vertinimas kalbos vertimui', 'mk': 'Под морфосинтактичката ламба: Мултифактична евалуација на полските навреди во преведувањето на говорот', 'kk': 'Морфосинтактикалық линз астында: Орындау аудармасында Gender Bias- тың көпбұрышты оқу', 'ms': 'Di bawah Lensa Morfosintaktik: Pengesahan Berlipat-lipat Bias Gender dalam Terjemahan Cahaya', 'ml': 'Under the Morphosyntactic Lens: A Multifaceted Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'mt': 'Taħt il-Lenti Morfosintattika: Evalwazzjoni Multifacetta tal-Bias bejn is-Sessi fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Kellem', 'mn': 'Morphosyntactic Lens-ын доор: A Multifaced Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'no': 'Under Morphosyntactic Lens: Eit fleirfacing evaluering av Gender Bias i taleomsetjinga', 'ro': 'Sub obiectivul morfosintactic: o evaluare multifațetă a disfuncțiilor de gen în traducerea vorbirii', 'pl': 'Pod soczewką morfosyntaktyczną: Wieloaspektowa ocena uprzedzeń płciowych w tłumaczeniu mowy', 'sr': 'Pod morfosintaktičkim lensom: Multifaced Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Under det morfosyntaktiska objektivet: En mångfacetterad utvärdering av könsbias i talöversättning', 'so': 'Luqada Morphosyntactic hoostooda: Qiimeynta jinsiga ee afka kala duduwan', 'ur': 'Morphosyntactic Lens کے نیچے: A Multifaced Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'ta': 'Morphosyntactic Lens கீழ்:', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Theo lịch sử Morpheus: Một phần nhiều Đánh giá về giới tính luyến ái Biis trong Văn bản', 'bg': 'Под морфосинтактичната леща: Многостранна оценка на половите наклонности в превода на речта', 'da': 'Under den morfosyntaktiske linse: En mangfoldig vurdering af kønsfordele i taleoversættelse', 'nl': 'Onder de morfosyntactische lens: Een veelzijdige evaluatie van gendervoorraden in spraakvertaling', 'hr': 'Pod morfosintaktičkim lensom: Multifaceted Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'id': 'Under the Morphosyntactic Lens: A Multifaceted Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'de': 'Unter der morphosyntaktischen Linse: Eine facettenreiche Bewertung von Gender Bias in der Sprachübersetzung', 'fa': 'زیر لینز مورفوسنتاتیک: یک ارزیابی متعدد جنسی بیس در ترجمه سخنرانی', 'ko': '형태문법 시각에서의 언어 번역 성별 편견', 'tr': "Morphosyntaktik Lins'i흫 altynda: Bir n채챌e 첵체zl체 Ta첵첵arlama (Gender Bias in Speech Translation)", 'sw': 'Kwa chini ya matangazo ya Kimorphosyntic: Uthibitisho wa Bima ya Jinsia katika Tafsiri ya Kizungumzo', 'af': "Onder die Morphosyntactic Lens: ' n Multifaced Evaluering van Gender Bias in Speech Translation", 'sq': 'Nën Lens in Morfosintaktik: Një vlerësim i shumëfaqesuar i dëmtimeve të gjinës në përkthimin e fjalës', 'hy': 'Մորֆոսինտակտիկ ոսպնյակի տակ. լեզվի թարգմանության մեջ գենդերային շեղումների բազմատեսակ գնահատումը', 'am': 'በንግግር ትርጓሜ ውስጥ የሴት ቢas የሙሉ ብዛት ውጤት', 'bn': 'মরোফোসিক্যাটিক লেন্সের নীচে: ভাষার অনুবাদে লিঙ্গ বিয়াসের মাল্টিফেসেট প্রমাণ', 'az': 'Morphosyntactic Lens altında: A Multifaced Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'bs': 'Pod morfosintaktičkim lensom: Multifaced Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation', 'cs': 'Pod morfosyntaktickou čočkou: mnohostranné hodnocení genderových předpokladů v překladu řeči', 'et': 'Morfosüntaktilise läätse all: soolise kalduvuse mitmekülgne hindamine kõnetõlkes', 'fi': 'Morfosyntaktisen linssin alla: Sukupuolten taipumusten monipuolinen arviointi puheen kääntämisessä', 'ca': 'Sob el Lens Morfosinàctic: Una evaluació multifacetada dels biaixos de gènere en la traducció de la voz', 'jv': 'Ato neng modèn Marphosinaactive Lens: Aowah luwih bantuan karo Gender Bias nang Terjamahan', 'he': 'תחת העדשה המורפוסינטקטית: הערכה מרובה-פנים של סבלנות מין בתרגום דיבורים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Pod morfosintaktično lečo: večplastno ocenjevanje spolnih pristranskosti pri prevajanju govora', 'bo': 'Under the Morphosyntactic Lens: A Multifaced Evaluation of Gender Bias in Speech Translation'}
{'en': 'Regularization methods applying input perturbation have drawn considerable attention and have been frequently explored for NMT tasks in recent years Despite their simplicity and effectiveness we argue that these methods are limited by the under fitting of training data In this paper we utilize prediction difference for ground truth tokens to analyze the fitting of token level samples and find that under fitting is almost as common as over fitting We introduce prediction difference regularization PD R a simple and effective method that can reduce over fitting and under fitting at the same time For all token level samples PD R minimizes the prediction difference between the original pass and the input perturbed pass making the model less sensitive to small input changes thus more robust to both perturbations and under fitted training data Experiments on three widely used WMT translation tasks show that our approach can significantly improve over existing perturbation regularization methods On WMT16 En De task our model achieves 1.80 SacreBLEU improvement over vanilla transformer', 'ar': 'يُعترف بالتحيز الجنساني إلى حد كبير كظاهرة إشكالية تؤثر على تقنيات اللغة ، حيث أكدت الدراسات الحديثة أنه قد يظهر بشكل مختلف عبر اللغات. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم ممارسات التقييم الحالية تتبنى تركيزًا على مستوى الكلمات على مجموعة ضيقة من الأسماء المهنية في ظل ظروف تركيبية. تتغاضى مثل هذه البروتوكولات عن السمات الرئيسية للغات النوع الاجتماعي النحوية ، والتي تتميز بسلاسل مورفوسينتيكتيك من اتفاق الجنس ، مميزة على مجموعة متنوعة من العناصر المعجمية وأجزاء الكلام (POS). للتغلب على هذا القيد ، نقوم بإثراء مجموعة MuST-SHE الطبيعية والمراعية للنوع الاجتماعي (Bentivogli et al. ، 2020) بطبقتين من التعليقات التوضيحية اللغوية الجديدة (POS وسلاسل الاتفاقية) ، واستكشاف إلى أي مدى تكون الفئات المعجمية المختلفة وظواهر الاتفاقية تتأثر بالانحرافات بين الجنسين. مع التركيز على ترجمة الكلام ، نجري تقييمًا متعدد الأوجه لثلاث اتجاهات لغوية (الإنجليزية - الفرنسية / الإيطالية / الإسبانية) ، مع نماذج مدربة على كميات متفاوتة من البيانات وتقنيات مختلفة لتجزئة الكلمات. من خلال تسليط الضوء على سلوكيات النموذج ، والتحيز الجنساني ، واكتشافه على عدة مستويات من التفصيل ، تؤكد النتائج التي توصلنا إليها على قيمة التحليلات المخصصة التي تتجاوز النتائج الإجمالية المجمعة.', 'fr': "Les préjugés sexistes sont largement reconnus comme un phénomène problématique affectant les technologies langagières, des études récentes soulignant qu'ils peuvent apparaître différemment d'une langue à l'autre. Cependant, la plupart des pratiques d'évaluation actuelles mettent l'accent sur un ensemble restreint de noms professionnels dans des conditions synthétiques. Ces protocoles négligent les principales caractéristiques des langues grammaticales de genre, caractérisées par des chaînes morphosyntaxiques d'accord entre les sexes, marquées sur une variété d'éléments lexicaux et de parties du discours (POS). Pour surmonter cette limitation, nous enrichissons le corpus naturel et sensible au genre Must-she (Bentivogli et al., 2020) avec deux nouvelles couches d'annotations linguistiques (POS et chaînes d'accords), et explorons dans quelle mesure les différentes catégories lexicales et les phénomènes d'accord sont impactés par les biais de genre. En nous concentrant sur la traduction vocale, nous menons une évaluation multidimensionnelle dans trois directions linguistiques (anglais-français/italien/espagnol), avec des modèles formés à différentes quantités de données et différentes techniques de segmentation de mots. En mettant en lumière les comportements des modèles, les préjugés sexistes et leur détection à plusieurs niveaux de granularité, nos résultats mettent l'accent sur la valeur des analyses dédiées au-delà des résultats globaux agrégés.", 'es': 'El sesgo de género se reconoce en gran medida como un fenómeno problemático que afecta a las tecnologías del lenguaje, y estudios recientes subrayan que puede aparecer de manera diferente entre idiomas. Sin embargo, la mayoría de las prácticas de evaluación actuales adoptan un enfoque a nivel de palabras en un conjunto limitado de sustantivos ocupacionales en condiciones sintéticas. Dichos protocolos pasan por alto las características clave de los lenguajes gramaticales de género, que se caracterizan por cadenas morfosintácticas de acuerdo de género, marcadas en una variedad de elementos léxicos y partes del habla (POS). Para superar esta limitación, enriquecemos el corpus natural y sensible al género (Bentivogli et al., 2020) con dos nuevas capas de anotación lingüística (POS y cadenas de acuerdos), y exploramos hasta qué punto las diferentes categorías léxicas y los fenómenos de acuerdo se ven afectados por los sesgos de género. Centrándonos en la traducción de voz, realizamos una evaluación multifacética en tres direcciones lingüísticas (inglés/francés/italiano/español), con modelos capacitados en cantidades variables de datos y diferentes técnicas de segmentación de palabras. Al arrojar luz sobre los comportamientos de los modelos, el sesgo de género y su detección en varios niveles de granularidad, nuestros hallazgos enfatizan el valor de los análisis dedicados más allá de los resultados globales agregados.', 'pt': 'O preconceito de gênero é amplamente reconhecido como um fenômeno problemático que afeta as tecnologias da linguagem, com estudos recentes ressaltando que ele pode surgir de maneira diferente entre os idiomas. No entanto, a maioria das práticas de avaliação atuais adota um foco em nível de palavra em um conjunto restrito de substantivos ocupacionais sob condições sintéticas. Esses protocolos ignoram as principais características das linguagens gramaticais de gênero, que são caracterizadas por cadeias morfossintáticas de concordância de gênero, marcadas em uma variedade de itens lexicais e partes do discurso (POS). Para superar essa limitação, enriquecemos o corpus MuST-SHE natural e sensível ao gênero (Bentivogli et al., 2020) com duas novas camadas de anotação linguística (POS e cadeias de concordância) e exploramos até que ponto diferentes categorias lexicais e fenômenos de concordância são afetadas por desvios de gênero. Com foco na tradução de fala, realizamos uma avaliação multifacetada em três direções linguísticas (inglês-francês/italiano/espanhol), com modelos treinados em diferentes quantidades de dados e diferentes técnicas de segmentação de palavras. Ao esclarecer os comportamentos do modelo, o viés de gênero e sua detecção em vários níveis de granularidade, nossas descobertas enfatizam o valor de análises dedicadas além dos resultados gerais agregados.', 'ja': 'ジェンダーバイアスは、言語テクノロジーに影響を与える問題のある現象としてほとんど認識されており、最近の研究では、言語間で異なって見える可能性があることが強調されています。 しかしながら、現在の評価実践のほとんどは、合成条件下で職業名詞の狭いセットに単語レベルの焦点を当てることを採用している。 このようなプロトコルは、さまざまな語彙項目や発話部分（ POS ）にマークされた、ジェンダー合意の形態素論的連鎖によって特徴付けられる文法的ジェンダー言語の主要な特徴を見落としている。 この制限を克服するために、私たちは2つの新しい言語アノテーションレイヤー（ POSおよび合意チェーン）で自然で性別に敏感なMuST - SHEコーパス（ Bentivogli et al., 2020 ）を豊かにし、さまざまな語彙カテゴリーと合意現象が性別のずれによってどの程度影響を受けるかを探求します。 音声翻訳に焦点を当て、3つの言語の方向性（英語-フランス語/イタリア語/スペイン語）について多面的な評価を行い、さまざまな量のデータと異なる単語セグメンテーション技術についてトレーニングを受けたモデルを使用します。 モデルの行動、性別の偏見、およびいくつかのレベルの粒度での検出を明らかにすることにより、私たちの調査結果は、集約された全体的な結果を超えた専用分析の価値を強調しています。', 'zh': '性别偏见,谓之言语之问,近者研强,或异言之异也。 然目前多质用词级注合为名词。 此忽于语法言语之要,以形句法链为之,著于词汇目词性(POS)。 为克此限,以两新语注重(POS与协议)富自然,于性别敏感之MuST-SHE语料库(Bentivogli等,2020),并求性别扭曲于多大程度词汇类与协议。 注于音译,三言(英语 - 法语/意大利语/西班牙语)质,模形异数,分词术训练。 以明模形之行,性别偏见及数粒度之检,吾等究其超越之专析也。', 'hi': 'लिंग पूर्वाग्रह को काफी हद तक भाषा प्रौद्योगिकियों को प्रभावित करने वाली एक समस्याग्रस्त घटना के रूप में मान्यता प्राप्त है, हाल के अध्ययनों में यह रेखांकित किया गया है कि यह भाषाओं में अलग-अलग सतह पर आ सकता है। हालांकि, अधिकांश वर्तमान मूल्यांकन प्रथाएं सिंथेटिक परिस्थितियों में व्यावसायिक संज्ञाओं के एक संकीर्ण सेट पर एक शब्द-स्तरीय फोकस को अपनाती हैं। इस तरह के प्रोटोकॉल व्याकरणिक लिंग भाषाओं की प्रमुख विशेषताओं को अनदेखा करते हैं, जो लिंग समझौते की मॉर्फोसिंटैक्टिक श्रृंखलाओं की विशेषता है, जो विभिन्न प्रकार के लेक्सिकल आइटम और पार्ट्स-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) पर चिह्नित हैं। इस सीमा को दूर करने के लिए, हम दो नए भाषाई एनोटेशन परतों (पीओएस और समझौता श्रृंखलाओं) के साथ प्राकृतिक, लिंग-संवेदनशील MuST-SHE कॉर्पस (Bentivogli et al., 2020) को समृद्ध करते हैं, और यह पता लगाते हैं कि विभिन्न लेक्सिकल श्रेणियां और समझौते की घटनाएं किस हद तक प्रभावित होती हैं लिंग skews। भाषण अनुवाद पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हुए, हम तीन भाषा निर्देशों (अंग्रेजी-फ्रेंच / इतालवी / स्पेनिश) पर एक बहुआयामी मूल्यांकन करते हैं, जिसमें अलग-अलग मात्रा में डेटा और विभिन्न शब्द विभाजन तकनीकों पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल होते हैं। मॉडल व्यवहार, लिंग पूर्वाग्रह, और ग्रैन्युलैरिटी के कई स्तरों पर इसका पता लगाने पर प्रकाश डालकर, हमारे निष्कर्ष एकत्रित समग्र परिणामों से परे समर्पित विश्लेषण के मूल्य पर जोर देते हैं।', 'ru': 'Гендерная предвзятость широко признается в качестве проблемного явления, влияющего на языковые технологии, при этом недавние исследования подчеркивают, что она может по-разному проявляться в разных языках. Однако в большинстве современных методов оценки акцент делается на узком наборе профессиональных существительных в синтетических условиях. Такие протоколы упускают из виду ключевые особенности грамматических гендерных языков, которые характеризуются морфосинтаксическими цепочками гендерного согласия, отмеченными на различных лексических элементах и частях речи (POS). Чтобы преодолеть это ограничение, мы обогащаем естественный, гендерно-чувствительный корпус MuST-SHE (Bentivogli et al., 2020) двумя новыми лингвистическими слоями аннотаций (POS и цепочки согласования) и исследуем, в какой степени на различные лексические категории и явления согласования влияют гендерные перекосы. Сосредоточившись на переводе речи, мы проводим многогранную оценку по трем языковым направлениям (английский-французский/итальянский/испанский), с моделями, обученными различным объемам данных и различным методам сегментации слов. Проливая свет на модели поведения, гендерную предвзятость и ее обнаружение на нескольких уровнях детализации, наши результаты подчеркивают ценность специализированных анализов, выходящих за рамки агрегированных общих результатов.', 'ga': 'Aithnítear laofacht inscne den chuid is mó mar fheiniméan fadhbach a théann i bhfeidhm ar theicneolaíochtaí teanga, agus léirigh staidéir a rinneadh le déanaí go bhféadfadh sé teacht chun cinn ar bhealach difriúil trasna teangacha. Mar sin féin, glacann an chuid is mó de na cleachtais mheastóireachta reatha fócas ar leibhéal na bhfocal ar thacar cúng d’ainmfhocail cheirde faoi choinníollacha sintéiseacha. Breathnaítear i bprótacail den sórt sin ar phríomhghnéithe de theangacha gramadaí inscne, arb iad is sainairíonna iad slabhraí morfosyntachta de chomhaontú inscne, marcáilte ar éagsúlacht míreanna foclóireachta agus codanna cainte (POS). Chun an teorannú seo a shárú, saibhrímid an corpas Must-SHE nádúrtha atá íogair ó thaobh inscne (Bentivogli et al., 2020) le dhá shraith nua nótaí teanga (POS agus slabhraí comhaontaithe), agus déanaimid iniúchadh ar cé chomh mór agus atá catagóirí éagsúla foclóireachta agus feiniméin chomhaontaithe. tionchar ag skews inscne. Ag díriú ar aistriúchán cainte, déanaimid meastóireacht ilghnéitheach ar thrí threo teanga (Béarla-Fraincis/Iodáilis/Spáinnis), le múnlaí oilte ar mhéideanna éagsúla sonraí agus ar theicnící éagsúla deighilte focal. Tríd an bhfianaise a thapú ar iompraíochtaí samhla, ar chlaonadh inscne, agus ar a bhrath ar leibhéil éagsúla gráinneachta, leagann ár dtorthaí béim ar luach na n-anailísí tiomnaithe thar thorthaí iomlána comhiomlána.', 'el': 'Η προκατάληψη των φύλων αναγνωρίζεται σε μεγάλο βαθμό ως προβληματικό φαινόμενο που επηρεάζει τις γλωσσικές τεχνολογίες, με πρόσφατες μελέτες να υπογραμμίζουν ότι μπορεί να εμφανιστεί διαφορετικά στις γλώσσες. Ωστόσο, οι περισσότερες από τις τρέχουσες πρακτικές αξιολόγησης υιοθετούν μια εστίαση σε επίπεδο λέξεων σε ένα στενό σύνολο επαγγελματικών ουσιαστικών υπό συνθετικές συνθήκες. Τέτοια πρωτόκολλα παραβλέπουν βασικά χαρακτηριστικά των γραμματικών γλωσσών φύλων, οι οποίες χαρακτηρίζονται από μορφοσυντακτικές αλυσίδες συμφωνίας φύλου, που επισημαίνονται σε μια ποικιλία λεξικών στοιχείων και τμημάτων ομιλίας. Για να ξεπεραστεί αυτός ο περιορισμός, εμπλουτίζουμε το φυσικό, ευαίσθητο στο φύλο σώμα με δύο νέα γλωσσικά στρώματα σχολιασμού (και αλυσίδες συμφωνίας), και διερευνούμε σε ποιο βαθμό διαφορετικές λεξικές κατηγορίες και φαινόμενα συμφωνίας επηρεάζονται από τις στρεβλώσεις φύλου. Εστιάζοντας στη μετάφραση ομιλίας, διεξάγουμε μια πολύπλευρη αξιολόγηση σε τρεις γλωσσικές κατευθύνσεις (Αγγλικά-Γαλλικά/Ιταλικά/Ισπανικά), με μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα σε ποικίλες ποσότητες δεδομένων και διαφορετικές τεχνικές κατάτμησης λέξεων. Ρίχνοντας φως στις συμπεριφορές μοντέλων, την προκατάληψη φύλου και την ανίχνευση της σε διάφορα επίπεδα κοκκοποίησης, τα ευρήματά μας τονίζουν την αξία των ειδικών αναλύσεων πέρα από τα συγκεντρωτικά συνολικά αποτελέσματα.', 'hu': 'A nemek közötti elfogultság nagyrészt a nyelvtechnológiákat érintő problémás jelenségnek tekinthető, a legutóbbi tanulmányok hangsúlyozzák, hogy a nyelvek között eltérően jelennek meg. A jelenlegi értékelési gyakorlatok többsége azonban szószintű hangsúlyt fektet a szintetikus körülmények közötti foglalkozási főnevek szűk halmazára. Az ilyen protokollok figyelmen kívül hagyják a nyelvtani nemi nyelvek kulcsfontosságú jellemzőit, amelyeket a nemi megegyezés morfoszintatikus láncai jellemeznek, amelyek különböző lexikai tételeken és beszédrészeken (POS) jelölnek. Ennek a korlátozásnak a leküzdése érdekében a természetes, nemi érzékeny MuST-SHE korpuszt (Bentivogli et al., 2020) két új nyelvi jegyzetelési réteggel gazdagítjuk (POS és megállapodási láncok), és feltárjuk, hogy a különböző lexikai kategóriákat és megállapodási jelenségeket milyen mértékben befolyásolják a nemi eltérések. A beszédfordításra összpontosítva három nyelvi irányban (angol-francia/olasz/spanyol) sokoldalú értékelést végzünk, különböző adatmennyiségű modellekkel és különböző szószegmentálási technikákkal. A modell viselkedésének, a nemi elfogultságnak, valamint a granularitás több szintjén történő kimutatásának megvilágításával eredményeink hangsúlyozzák a dedikált elemzések értékét az összesített általános eredményeken túl.', 'it': 'Il pregiudizio di genere è ampiamente riconosciuto come un fenomeno problematico che colpisce le tecnologie linguistiche, con studi recenti che sottolineano che potrebbe emergere in modo diverso tra le lingue. Tuttavia, la maggior parte delle attuali pratiche di valutazione adotta un focus a livello di parola su una serie ristretta di sostantivi professionali in condizioni sintetiche. Tali protocolli trascurano le caratteristiche chiave dei linguaggi grammaticali di genere, che sono caratterizzati da catene morfosintattiche di accordo di genere, marcate su una varietà di elementi lessicali e parti di discorso (POS). Per superare questa limitazione, arricchiamo il corpus MuST-SHE naturale e sensibile al genere (Bentivogli et al., 2020) con due nuovi livelli di annotazione linguistica (POS e catene di accordi), ed esploriamo in che misura diverse categorie lessicali e fenomeni di accordo sono influenzati da distorsioni di genere. Concentrandoci sulla traduzione vocale, conduciamo una valutazione poliedrica su tre direzioni linguistiche (inglese-francese/italiano/spagnolo), con modelli formati su quantità variabili di dati e tecniche di segmentazione delle parole. Mettendo in luce i comportamenti dei modelli, i pregiudizi di genere e la sua rilevazione a diversi livelli di granularità, i nostri risultati sottolineano il valore di analisi dedicate al di là dei risultati complessivi aggregati.', 'ka': 'გენერების წარმოდგენები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია როგორც პრობლემატიური ფენომენი, რომელიც ენერგიის ტექნოლოგიების შესახებ, რომელიც ახალი სწავლებების შესახებ, რომ ეს მაგრამ მხოლოდ, მხოლოდ მიმდინარე განსაზღვრების პრაქტიკები სიტყვების დონეზე კონუქტირება სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუ ასეთი პროტოკოლობი გრამიკალური გენექტური ენების გასაკუთრებულ ფუნქციები, რომლებიც გენექტურის მოპორფსინტაქტიური კონტაქტიური კონტაქტიური კონტაქტიური კონტაქტიური კონტაქტიები რომ გადავიწყებთ ეს დაზრუქება, ჩვენ განვითარებთ ნახვა ლექსიკალური კატეგორიები და შესაძლებლობის ფენომენები (Bentivogli et al., 2020) და ორი ახალი ენგორიტიკური ანოტაციის ნაგულებით (POS და შესაძლებლობის ნაგულები) და განვითარებთ რამდენიმე განსხვავებული ლ სიტყვების გარგულისხმების შესახებ, ჩვენ მრავალფერი განსაზღვრებას სამი ენაზე (ანგლისური-ფრანუსი/თრალიანი/სპანუსი) გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც მოდელები განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების და განსხვ მოდელური ქცევების, გენდური წარმოდგენების და მისი განსახულება რამდენიმე დრანულაციის დონეზე, ჩვენი მონაცემები განსახულებული ანალიზების მნიშვნელობას აღწერენ, რომლებიც აღწერენ უ', 'lt': 'Lyčių pusiausvyra iš esmės pripažįstama probleminiu reiškiniu, turinčiu įtakos kalbų technologijoms, o naujausiuose tyrimuose pabrėžiama, kad kalbos gali skirtingai išplisti. Tačiau dauguma dabartinių vertinimo praktikų sutelkia dėmesį į siaurą profesinių vardų rinkinį sintetinėmis sąlygomis. Tokiuose protokoluose neatsižvelgiama į pagrindinius gramatinių lyčių kalbų požymius, kuriuos apibūdina lyties susitarimo morfosintakcinės grandinės, pažymėtos įvairiais leksiniais straipsniais ir kalbos dalimis (POS). Siekdami įveikti šį apribojimą, mes praturtiname natūralų, lyties požiūriu jautrią MuST-SHE korpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020 m.) dviem naujais kalbinių anotacijų sluoksniais (POS ir susitarimo grandinės) ir ištiriame, kokiu mastu skirtingos leksinės kategorijos ir susitarimo reiškiniai turi įtakos lyčių nuokrypiams. Svarstydami kalbos vertimą, atliekame daugialypį trijų kalbų krypčių vertinimą (anglų, prancūzų, italų ir ispanų kalbomis), kuriame rengiami skirtingi duomenų kiekiai ir skirtingi žodžių segmentavimo metodai. Išskleidžiant šviesą modelio elgesiui, lyčių pusiausvyrai ir jo nustatymui keliuose granuliarumo lygiuose, mūsų išvados pabrėžia specialių analizių vertę, viršijančią bendruosius rezultatus.', 'ms': 'Kebiasaan jenis dikenali sebahagian besar sebagai fenomena problematik yang mempengaruhi teknologi bahasa, dengan kajian baru-baru ini menyatakan bahawa ia mungkin berlainan di seluruh bahasa. Namun, kebanyakan praktek penilaian semasa mengadopsi fokus aras perkataan pada set sempit nama pekerjaan di bawah syarat sintetik. Such protocols overlook key features of grammatical gender languages, which are characterized by morphosyntactic chains of gender agreement, marked on a variety of lexical items and parts-of-speech (POS).  Untuk mengatasi keterangan ini, kami memperkaya MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) secara semulajadi, sensitif-jenis dengan dua lapisan annotasi bahasa baru (POS dan rantai perjanjian), dan mengeksplorasi seberapa banyak kategori leksik berbeza dan fenomena perjanjian terpengaruh oleh skews jenis. Berfokus pada terjemahan ucapan, kami melakukan penilaian berbilang-muka pada tiga arah bahasa (Inggeris-Perancis/Itali/Sepanyol), dengan model dilatih pada jumlah data berbeza dan teknik segmen perkataan berbeza. Dengan melemparkan cahaya pada perilaku model, bias jenis, dan pengesan pada beberapa tahap granularitas, penemuan kami menekankan nilai analisis dedikasi melebihi hasil keseluruhan aggregat.', 'kk': 'Жалғыз тәжірибелер тілдер технологияларына әсер ететін мәселелер ретінде табылады. Соңғы зерттеулерде ол тілдерден айырмашылық болуы мүмкін. Бірақ назардағы бағалау практикасының көпшілігі синтетикалық шарттарында сөздің деңгейіне көңіл береді. Бұл протоколдар грамматикалық гендер тілдерінің негізгі мүмкіндіктерін қарай қарайды. Бұл гендердің морфосинтактикалық тіліктері, әртүрлі лексикалық нысандар мен сөйлеу бөліктері (POS) бойынша белгіледі. Бұл шектеулерді көтеру үшін, біз табиғи, гендерлік сезімді MuST-SHE корпус (Bentivogli et al., 2020) мен екі жаңа лингвистикалық жазбалар қабаттары (POS және келесімдік тізбектері) қолданып, гендерлік шектеулері мен келесімдік пайдаланулары қаншалықтың Орындау аудармасына көптеген үш тіл бағыттарына (ағылшын-француз/итальян/испан) көптеген оқиға береміз. Өзгертілген деректер мен әртүрлі сөздердің сегментациялау техникаларында оқиғалатын мо Үлгі қасиеттерді, гендердің қасиеттерін және оның бірнеше гранулациялық деңгейінде анықтау үшін бір жарықты анализдердің мәнін бағыттайды.', 'mk': 'Порасните предрасуди се препознаваат во голема мера како проблематичен феномен кој влијае на јазичните технологии, со неодамнешните студии истакнувајќи дека може да се појави различно низ јазиците. However, most of current evaluation practices adopt a word-level focus on a narrow set of occupational nouns under synthetic conditions.  Таквите протоколи ги прегледуваат клучните карактеристики на граматичките полски јазици, кои се карактеризирани од морфосинтактичките ланцеви на полскиот договор, обележани на различни лексикални предмети и делови од говорот (POS). За да го надминеме ова ограничување, го богатуваме природниот, сексуално чувствителен муST-SHE корпус (Bentivogli и други, 2020) со два нови слоја на јазични анотации (POS и ланцеви на договори), и истражуваме во каков степен различните лексикални категории и феномени на договори се влијани од генералните скриви. Со фокус на преводот на говорот, спроведуваме мултифактична евалуација на три јазични насоки (англиско-француски/италијански/шпански), со модели обучени на различни количини на податоци и различни техники на сегментација на зборо Со фрлање на светлина на моделните однесувања, генералната пристрасност и неговото откривање на неколку нивоа на грануларност, нашите откритија ја истакнуваат вредноста на посветени анализи надвор од агрегетираните целокупни резултати.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ സാങ്കേതിക സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയെ ബാധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്രശ്നമായ നിലപാടാണ് എന്ന് ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്, അടുത്തുള്ള പ എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ വിലാസപ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും ഒരു വാക്ക് നിലയില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് സിന്\u200dറെറ്റിറ് ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള പ്രോട്ടോക്കോളുകള്\u200d ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകളുമായി മാറ്റിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പരിധിയെ വിജയിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ മുസ്റ്റ്-SHE കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ സമ്പന്നരാക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു പുതിയ ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d (പോസിന്\u200dറെയും കരാറിന്\u200dറെയും ചങ്ങലകളു സംസാര പരിഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ മുന്നില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു ഭാഷയുടെ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d പരിഗണന നടത്തുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-ഫ്രെഞ്ച്/ഇറ്റാലിയന്\u200d/സ്പാനിഷ് മ മോഡലിന്റെ സ്വഭാവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വെളിച്ചമാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, പെണ്\u200dകുട്ടികളെയും അതിന്റെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d മ', 'mt': 'Il-preġudizzju bejn is-sessi huwa rikonoxxut fil-biċċa l-kbira bħala fenomenu problematiku li jaffettwa t-teknoloġiji tal-lingwi, bi studji riċenti li jenfasizzaw li jista’ jkun hemm wiċċ differenti bejn il-lingwi. Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-prattiki attwali ta’ evalwazzjoni jadottaw fokus fuq livell ta’ kliem fuq sett dejjaq ta’ ismijiet okkupazzjonali taħt kundizzjonijiet sintetiċi. Protokolli bħal dawn jinjoraw il-karatteristiċi ewlenin tal-lingwi grammatiċi tas-sessi, li huma kkaratterizzati minn katini morfosintattiċi ta’ ftehim bejn is-sessi, immarkati fuq varjetà ta’ oġġetti lexiċi u partijiet ta’ diskors (POS). Biex tingħeleb din il-limitazzjoni, aħna nifrikkaw il-MuST-SHE corpus naturali u sensittiv għas-sessi (Bentivogli et al., 2020) b’żewġ saffi ġodda ta’ annotazzjoni lingwistika (POS u ktajjen ta’ ftehim), u nesploraw sa liema punt kategoriji lexiċi differenti u fenomeni ta’ ftehim huma affettwati minn skews tas-sessi. Meta niffokaw fuq it-traduzzjoni tad-diskors, nagħmlu evalwazzjoni b’diversi aspetti fuq tliet direzzjonijiet lingwistiċi (Ingliż-Franċiż/Taljan/Spanjol), b’mudelli mħarrġa fuq ammonti varji ta’ dejta u tekniki differenti ta’ segmentazzjoni tal-kliem. Billi nixfu dawl fuq imġibiet mudell, il-preġudizzju bejn is-sessi, u l-individwazzjoni tiegħu f’diversi livelli ta’ granularità, is-sejbiet tagħna jenfasizzaw il-valur ta’ analiżi ddedikata lil hinn mir-riżultati globali aggregati.', 'no': 'Sjenær forvirkning er stort gjenkjent som eit problematisk fenomen som påvirkar språk-teknologi, med nyleg studier som undersøker at det kan overflate ulike språk. Dei fleste av gjeldande evalueringspraksisar har imidlertid eit ordnivåfokus på ein liten sett med profesjonalnamn under syntetiske vilkår. Desse protokollene oversjå nøkkelfunksjonar på grammatiske seksspråk, som er karakterisert av morfosyntaktiske kjeder med seks-avtale, merkt på mange leksiske elementar og deler av tale (POS). For å overføre denne grensen, røyke vi den naturlege, seks-sensitive MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) med to nye språkstiske annotasjonslag (POS og samtalekjeder) og utforske kva storleik forskjellige leksikologiske kategoriar og samtalefenomena er påvirka av seks-sker. Fokuserer vi om taleomsetjinga, gjer vi eit fleirfaciert evaluering på tre språkkretningar (engelsk/fransk/italsk/spansk), med modeller som treng på ulike mengdar data og ulike ordsegmenteringsteknikk. Ved å gjere lys på modelleoppførsel, seks-forsikt og oppdaginga på fleire granularitetsnivåar, oppdagingane våre understrekar verdien av spesifiserte analyser enn totale resultat.', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл хандлага нь хэл технологийг нөлөөлдөг асуудлын явдал гэж ихэвчлэн анзаарсан. Саяхан судалгаагаар хэл дээр өөр өөр хэлбэртэй байж болох боломжтой. Гэвч одоогийн оюун шалгалтын ихэнх үйл ажиллагааны нэр тоог синтетик нөхцөлд бага хэмжээнд төвлөрүүлдэг. Ийм протоколууд грамматикийн гендер хэлний чухал төлөвлөгөөг харуулдаг. Энэ нь гендер зөвлөгөөний морфосинтактик хэлбэрээр дүрслэгдсэн, олон хэлбэрээр илэрхийлэгдсэн хэлбэрээр тэмдэглэгдсэн. Энэ хязгаарыг давхарлахын тулд бид байгалийн, гендер-сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй MuST-SHE корпус (Bentivogli et al., 2020) хоёр шинэ хэлний анзаарлын давхар (POS болон солилцооны хэлбэрээр) баялагдсан бөгөөд гендер шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрээр ямар өөр хэлбэрээр нөлөөлд Бид илтгэлийн хөрөнгө оруулалтын тухай анхаарлаа 3 хэл замаар (Англи-Француз/Итали/Испан) олон талын үнэлгээ хийдэг. Мөн өөр хэлбэрийн өгөгдлийн, өөр хэлбэрийн хэмжээний хэмжээний технологи дээр сург Загварын үйл ажиллагаа, гендер хандлага, олон түвшинд грануляр байдлын тухай гэрлийг тодорхойлоход бидний олж мэдсэн зүйлс нийтлэг үр дүнээс гадна зориулсан шинжилгээний үнэ цэнэтэй.', 'pl': 'Stronniczość płci jest w dużej mierze uznawana za problematyczne zjawisko wpływające na technologie językowe, a ostatnie badania podkreślają, że może występować inaczej w poszczególnych językach. Jednak większość obecnych praktyk oceny skupia się na poziomie słowa na wąskim zbiorze rzeczowników zawodowych w warunkach syntetycznych. Protokoły takie pomijają kluczowe cechy gramatycznych języków płci, które charakteryzują się morfosyntaktycznymi łańcuchami porozumienia płci, oznaczonymi na różnych elementach leksykalnych i częściach mowy (POS). Aby przezwyciężyć to ograniczenie, wzbogacamy naturalny, wrażliwy na płeć korpus MuST-SHE (Bentivogli et al., 2020) o dwie nowe warstwy adnotacji językowej (POS i łańcuchy porozumień) oraz badamy, w jakim stopniu różne kategorie leksykaliczne i zjawiska porozumień mają wpływ na zakłócenia płci. Skupiając się na tłumaczeniu mowy, przeprowadzamy wieloaspektową ocenę na trzech kierunkach językowych (angielsko-francusko/włoski/hiszpański), z modelami przeszkolonymi na różnych ilościach danych i różnych technik segmentacji słów. Rzucając światło na zachowania modeli, uprzedzenia płci i ich wykrywanie na kilku poziomach granularności, nasze ustalenia podkreślają wartość dedykowanych analiz poza zagregowanymi ogólnymi wynikami.', 'ro': 'Prejudecățile de gen sunt recunoscute în mare măsură ca un fenomen problematic care afectează tehnologiile lingvistice, studiile recente subliniind faptul că ar putea apărea diferit în fiecare limbă. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea practicilor actuale de evaluare adoptă un accent la nivel de cuvânt asupra unui set restrâns de substantive profesionale în condiții sintetice. Astfel de protocoale trec cu vederea caracteristicile cheie ale limbajelor gramaticale de gen, care sunt caracterizate prin lanțuri morfosintactice de acord de gen, marcate pe o varietate de elemente lexicale și părți de vorbire (POS). Pentru a depăși această limită, îmbogățim corpusul MuST-SHE natural, sensibil la gen (Bentivogli et al., 2020) cu două noi straturi de adnotare lingvistică (POS și lanțuri de acord), și explorăm în ce măsură diferitele categorii lexicale și fenomene de acord sunt afectate de diferențele de gen. Concentrându-ne pe traducerea vorbirii, efectuăm o evaluare multifațată pe trei direcții lingvistice (engleză-franceză/italiană/spaniolă), cu modele instruite pe cantități variate de date și tehnici diferite de segmentare a cuvintelor. Prin punerea în lumină a comportamentelor modelului, a prejudecăților de gen și a detectării acestuia la mai multe niveluri de granularitate, constatările noastre subliniază valoarea analizelor dedicate dincolo de rezultatele globale agregate.', 'so': 'Waxqabadka jinsiga waxaa loo aqoonsadaa sida xaalad dhibaato leh oo ku saabsan teknolojiyo luuqada, taasoo lagu xaqiijiyey waxbarashada ugu dambeysay inay kala duwan tahay luuqadaha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, hablada qiimeynta ee haatan badankoodu waxay koriyaan hadal-heer oo ku kalsoonaadaan noocyo fudud oo shaqaalaha ka hooseeya shuruudaha heshiiska. Qoraalkaas ayaa ka jeeda noocyo furan oo ku qoran luqadaha jimicsiga, kuwaas oo ku qoran qoraalka heshiiska jinsiga ah oo lagu qoray waxyaabo badan oo leksikal ah iyo qayb ka mid ah hadalka (POS). Si aan u adkayno xuduudahan, waxaynu hodanaynaa xuquuqda dabiicadda, jinsiga-SHE korpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) oo leh laba sabool oo cusub oo luqada ah (POS iyo heshiiska), waxaana baaraynaa si ay ugu saameyso kooxo kala duduwan oo leksikal ah iyo heshiiska waxyaabaha lagu saameyn karo jinsiga. Fokus-socoshada turjumista hadalka, waxaynu sameeynaa qiimeyn aad u kala duduwan saddex baro oo af ah (Ingiriis-Faraansiis/Talyaani/Isbanish), waxaana sameynaya modello lagu baray tiro badan oo macluumaad kala duduwan iyo qaabab kala duduwan oo hadal kala duduwan. Sida uu iftiimiyo dabeecada modellka, dabeecada jinsiga iyo sidoo kale lagu caddeeyo heerar kala duduwan oo qoyska ah, qiimaha baaritaanka gaarka ah waxaa ku qoran qiimeynta fasalka dhamaanka.', 'sv': 'Könsbias erkänns till stor del som ett problematiskt fenomen som påverkar språkteknik, och nyligen genomförda studier understryker att det kan dyka upp olika språk. De flesta nuvarande utvärderingsmetoder fokuserar dock på ordnivå på en begränsad uppsättning yrkessubstantiv under syntetiska förhållanden. Sådana protokoll förbiser viktiga drag i grammatiska genusspråk, som kännetecknas av morfosyntaktiska kedjor av könsöverenskommelse, markerade på en mängd olika lexikala objekt och delar av tal (POS). För att övervinna denna begränsning berikar vi den naturliga, könskänsliga MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) med två nya språkliga annotationslager (POS och avtalskedjor), och undersöker i vilken utsträckning olika lexikala kategorier och avtalsfenomen påverkas av könsskillnader. Med fokus på talöversättning genomför vi en mångfacetterad utvärdering av tre språkriktningar (engelska-franska/italienska/spanska), med modeller utbildade på olika datamängder och olika ordsegmenteringstekniker. Genom att belysa modellbeteenden, könsbias och dess upptäckt på flera nivåer av granularitet betonar våra resultat värdet av dedikerade analyser utöver aggregerade övergripande resultat.', 'sr': 'Ženske predrasude se uglavnom priznaju kao problematični fenomen koji utiče na jezičke tehnologije, a nedavna studija potvrđuju da bi se mogla drukčije površiti na jezicima. Međutim, većina trenutnih prakse procjene usvojila je koncentraciju na nivou reči na usku skupu profesionalnih imena pod sintetičkim uvjetima. Takvi protokoli pregledaju ključne karakteristike gramatičkih spolnih jezika, koje karakteriziraju morfosintaktički lanci spolnog sporazuma, označene na raznim leksičkim predmetima i dijelovima govora (POS). Da bi preuzeli ovu ograničenje, obogatili smo prirodni, osjetljivi muST-SHE korpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) sa dve nove slojeve jezičke annotacije (POS i lance sporazuma), i istražili u kakvoj mjeri različite leksičke kategorije i fenomene sporazuma utječu na spolne košulje. Fokusirajući se na prevod govora, vodimo višestruku procenu o tri jezičke upute (engleski-francuski/italijanski/španjolski), sa modelima obučenim na različitim količinama podataka i različitim tehnikama segmentacije riječi. Izbacivanjem svjetla na model ponašanja, spolne predrasude i njegovo otkrivanje na nekoliko nivoa granularnosti, naši nalazi naglašavaju vrijednost posvećenih analiza izvan aggregativnih ukupnih rezultata.', 'si': 'ජීන්ඩර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරනවා භාෂා තාක්ෂණාවක් වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ  නමුත්, ප්\u200dරස්තූත විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ගොඩක් වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සංවේ අනිවාර්ය ප්\u200dරොටොකෝල් overlook key Featuries of Gramatical Genr Links, that are characharacharacted by Morosyntactic chains of Genr Accords, Marked on a vary of lexic Items and part-of-language (POS). To overCome this Limation, we enrich the Native, Genr-sensive MuST-SHE Corus (Bentiviologie et al., 2022) with 2 new lingistic anotion layer (POS and එකඟ chains), and Explore to what estet Diffant lexic Categores and එකඟ fences are affected by sex skews. භාෂාව භාෂාවිතයෙන්, අපි භාෂාවිතය තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා (ඉංග්\u200dරේන්ස්-ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස්/ඉතාලියා/ස්පැනිස්) භාෂාවිතය මොඩල් විශ්ලේෂණය, ජෙන්ඩර් විශ්වාසය, ඒ වගේ පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ, අපේ හොයාගන්නේ අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයේ අවශ', 'ur': 'جنس کی مخالفت بہت سی مشکلات کے طور پر پہچان کی جاتی ہے جو زبان تکنولوژی پر اثر دیتی ہے، اور اچھے تحقیقات کے ساتھ یہ سمجھ رہے ہیں کہ یہ زبانوں میں مختلف طریقے سے مختلف ہو سکتا ہے۔ However, most of the current evaluation practices adopt a word-level focus on a narrow set of occupational nouns under synthetic conditions. ایسے پروٹروکولٹ گراماتیکی جنس زبانوں کی کلیدی ویژگی کو دکھا دیتے ہیں جن کو جنس موافقت کی موافقت کی موافقت کی موافقت کی موافقت کے ذریعے روشن کیا جاتا ہے، جو مختلف لکسیکی ایٹموٹوں اور بولنے کی قسموں پر علامت لگائی جاتی ہے۔ یہ محدودیت پر غالب ہونے کے لئے، ہم مائستی، جنسی-حساس مائستی-شی کورپوس (Bentivogli et al., 2020) کو دو نو زبان نوشتی لائر (POS اور معاملہ زنجیروں) کے ساتھ ثروت دیتے ہیں، اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ کس طرح مختلف لکیسی کائٹیوں اور معاملہ پڑھنے کی وجہ سے جنسی اسکوں کے ذریعہ اثر ہم کلام کی ترجمہ پر مہمانی کریں گے، ہم تین زبان کی طرف سے ایک متعدد مہمانی کریں گے (انگلیسی-فرانسوی/ایتالیایی/اسپانیایی/اسپانیایی) موڈل رفتار، جنس کی مخالفت اور اس کی تعبیر کے چند سطح پر روشنی کو پھیلانے کے ذریعہ، ہمارے معلومات نے مشترک تحلیل کا ارزش دکھایا ہے جو جمع ہونے والی نتائج کے علاوہ ہے.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலாக பிரச்சனையான பொருளாக உணர்ந்து கொள்ளப்படுகிறது மொழி தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பாதிக்கும் பொருளாக, சமீபத்தில் படிப ஆயினும், தற்போதைய ஆய்வு செயல்களில் பெரும்பாலான ஒரு வார்த்தை மட்டத்தில் கவனத்தை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறார்கள் ஒரு சிறிய வ இம்மைய நெறிமுறைகள் சிறந்த இனம் மொழிகளின் குணங்களை விட்டுவிடுகிறது, இம்மொழியில் ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பெண்களின் சங்கிலிகளால் குறிப்பிடப்பட இந்த வரம்பை வெற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் இயற்கையான, இனம் உணர்வுடைய முஸ்டி-SHE கோர்பாஸ் (பென்டிசிக்லி மற்றும் 2020) இரண்டு புதிய மொழி விளக்கம் அடுக்குகளுடன் வளர்ச்சி செய்கிறோம், மற்றும் வேறு வ பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் கவனம் செலுத்தப்படும் மூன்று மொழி திசைகளில் (ஆங்கிலம்- பிரெஞ்சு/இத்தாலியன்/ஸ்பானிஷ்), மாதிரிகள் மாதிரிகளில் மாறுபட மாதிரி நடத்தைகள், பெண்கள் பிரச்சனைகள் மற்றும் அதன் கண்டுபிடிப்பு பல நிலைகளில் உள்ளது, எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் குறிப்பிட்ட மொத்த முடிவுகளைவிட', 'uz': "Gen bias ko'pchilik tilning teknologiyani o'zgartiradigan muammolar deb belgilangan. Yaqinda o'rganish imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin, bu tillarning ko'pchiligini o'zgartirish mumkin. Lekin, hozirda ko'pchilik qiymatni bir necha xil holatda qo'shimcha muvaffaqiyatlarni foydalanadi. Ushbu protokollar grammatikal jinsiya tillarining xususiyatlarini orqali tugatadi. Bu soʻzlarning turli leksikal elementlari va gapirish qismlari (POS) bilan belgilangan sinov bir xil narsalar bilan ishlatiladi. Bu chegarani boshqarish uchun biz tabiiy, jinsiy sensitive MuST-SHE korpus (Bentivogli et al, 2020) bilan ikkita yangi lingvistik taʼminlovchi qanday narsa bilan o'ylaymiz, va to'g'ri bog'liq tarjimalarning qanday darajaga ko'rsatuvchimiz. Talab tarjima qilishda, biz uchta tilda qiymatni bajaramiz (Ingliz-Fransuzcha/Italyani/Ispancha) va har xil maʼlumot va boshqa so'zlar qismlarini o'rganish modellari bilan o'rganamiz. Model xususiyatlarini, jinsiyalar, va uning bir necha darajada aniqlash orqali ko'rsatish orqali ishlatish mumkin. Bizning qiymatimiz hamma natijalardan ko'paytirilgan aniqlarning qiymatini oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Giới tính nam giới được nhận ra là một hiện tượng gây rối loạn về các công nghệ ngôn ngữ, và các nghiên cứu gần đây đã nhấn mạnh rằng nó có thể xuất hiện khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các phương pháp đánh giá hiện thời dùng từ để tập trung vào các danh từ nghề nghiệp trong trường hợp tổng hợp. Các giao thức này bỏ qua các yếu tố chủ yếu của ngôn ngữ giới tính, được đánh dấu bởi các chuỗi di truyền của thỏa thuận giới tính, được đánh dấu trên nhiều thứ ngôn ngữ và các bộ phận ngôn ngữ (POS). Để vượt qua giới hạn này, chúng ta cải thiện tiềm năng, giới tính nhạy cảm MuST-Ả Corpus (Bentley ogli et al., 2020) với hai lớp ghi chú ngôn ngữ mới (chuỗi bưu kiện và hợp đồng), và tìm hiểu xem bao nhiêu điểm độc tính và các hiện tượng hiệp ước bị ảnh hưởng bởi giới tính. Tập trung vào dịch thuật giọng nói, chúng tôi tiến hành một đánh giá đa chiều về ba hướng ngôn ngữ (Anh-Pháp/Ý/Tây Ban Nha) với các mô hình được huấn luyện về lượng lượng khác nhau của dữ liệu và các kỹ thuật phân chia từ khác nhau. Khi soi sáng về cách cư xử của mô hình, khuynh hướng giới tính và cách phát hiện nó ở nhiều mức độ hạt, các kết quả phát hiện của chúng tôi nhấn mạnh giá trị của các phân tích chuyên môn vượt qua kết quả tổng hợp.', 'bg': 'Половите пристрастия до голяма степен се признават като проблемно явление, засягащо езиковите технологии, като последните проучвания подчертават, че те могат да се появят по различен начин в различните езици. Въпреки това, повечето от настоящите практики за оценяване възприемат фокус на ниво дума върху тесен набор от професионални съществителни при синтетични условия. Такива протоколи пренебрегват ключовите характеристики на граматичните полови езици, които се характеризират с морфосинтактични вериги на полово съгласие, маркирани върху различни лексикални елементи и части от речта (ПОС). За да преодолеем това ограничение, обогатяваме естествения, чувствителен към пола корпус с два нови езикови анотационни слоя (ПОС и вериги на съгласие) и изследваме до каква степен различните лексикални категории и явления на съгласие са повлияни от половите изкривявания. Фокусирайки се върху речния превод, провеждаме многостранна оценка в три езикови направления (английски-френски/италиански/испански), с модели обучени по различни количества данни и различни техники за сегментиране на думи. Чрез хвърлянето на светлина върху поведението на модела, половото пристрастие и неговото откриване на няколко нива на гранулираност, нашите констатации подчертават стойността на специализираните анализи отвъд обобщените общи резултати.', 'da': 'Kønsbias anerkendes i vid udstrækning som et problematisk fænomen, der påvirker sprogteknologier, og nylige undersøgelser understreger, at det kan dukke op anderledes på tværs af sprog. De fleste af de nuværende evalueringspraksis fokuserer imidlertid på ordniveau på et snævert sæt erhvervsnavne under syntetiske forhold. Sådanne protokoller overser vigtige træk i grammatiske kønssprog, som er kendetegnet ved morfosyntaktiske kæder af kønsaftale, markeret på en række leksikske emner og dele af tale (POS). For at overvinde denne begrænsning beriger vi det naturlige, kønsfølsomme MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) med to nye sproglige annotationslag (POS og aftalekæder), og undersøger i hvilket omfang forskellige leksikalske kategorier og aftalefænomener påvirkes af kønsskævheder. Med fokus på taleoversættelse foretager vi en alsidig evaluering af tre sprogretninger (engelsk-fransk/italiensk/spansk), med modeller trænet i forskellige mængder data og forskellige ordsegmenteringsteknikker. Ved at kaste lys over modeludfærd, kønsbias og dens påvisning på flere niveauer af granularitet understreger vores resultater værdien af dedikerede analyser ud over aggregerede samlede resultater.', 'nl': 'Gender bias wordt grotendeels erkend als een problematisch fenomeen dat taaltechnologieën beïnvloedt, waarbij recente studies onderstrepen dat het in verschillende talen verschillend kan opduiken. De meeste van de huidige evaluatiepraktijken hebben echter een focus op woordniveau op een smalle reeks beroepszelfstandige naamwoorden onder synthetische omstandigheden. Dergelijke protocollen negeren belangrijke kenmerken van grammaticale gendertalen, die worden gekenmerkt door morfosyntactische ketens van genderovereenkomst, gemarkeerd op een verscheidenheid van lexicale items en delen van spraak (POS). Om deze beperking te overwinnen verrijken we het natuurlijke, gender-gevoelige MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) met twee nieuwe linguïstische annotatielagen (POS en akkoord ketens) en onderzoeken we in hoeverre verschillende lexicale categorieën en overeenkomsten fenomenen worden beïnvloed door gender skews. We richten ons op spraakvertaling en voeren een veelzijdige evaluatie uit op drie taalrichtingen (Engels-Frans/Italiaans/Spaans), met modellen die zijn getraind op verschillende hoeveelheden gegevens en verschillende woordsegmentatietechnieken. Door licht te werpen op modelgedrag, gender bias en de detectie ervan op verschillende niveaus van granulariteit, benadrukken onze bevindingen de waarde van dedicated analyses die verder gaan dan geaggregeerde algemene resultaten.', 'hr': 'Ženska pristrasnost se uglavnom priznaje kao problematični fenomen koji utječe na jezičke tehnologije, a nedavno ispitivanje potvrđuje da bi se moglo drugačije površiti na jezicima. Međutim, većina trenutnih prakse procjene usvojila je koncentraciju na razini riječi na usku skupu profesionalnih imena pod sintetičkim uvjetima. Takvi protokoli pregledavaju ključne karakteristike gramatičkih spolnih jezika, koje karakteriziraju morfosintaktički lanci spolnog sporazuma, označene na raznim leksičkim predmetima i dijelovima govora (POS). Za prevladanje ovog ograničenja, obogatili smo prirodni, osjetljivi muST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) sa dvije nove slojeve jezičke annotacije (POS i lanci sporazuma), i istražiti u kakvoj mjeri su različite leksičke kategorije i fenomene sporazuma utjecali na spolne košulje. Fokusirajući se na prevod govora, vodimo višestruku procjenu o tri jezičke upute (engleski-francuski/italijanski/španjolski), s modelima obučenim na različitim količinama podataka i različitim tehnikama segmentacije riječi. Izbacivanjem svjetla na model ponašanja, spolne predrasude i njegovo otkrivanje na nekoliko razina granularnosti, naši nalazi naglašavaju vrijednost posvećenih analiza izvan aggregativnih ukupnih rezultata.', 'id': 'Kebiasaan jenis kebanyakan dikenal sebagai fenomena problematik yang mempengaruhi teknologi bahasa, dengan penelitian baru-baru ini menyatakan bahwa ia mungkin berbeda di berbagai bahasa. Namun, kebanyakan praktek evaluasi saat ini mengadopsi fokus tingkat kata pada set sempit nama pekerjaan dalam kondisi sintetis. Protokol tersebut mengabaikan ciri-ciri kunci bahasa kelamin gramatik, yang dikaraterisasikan oleh rantai morfosintaksi kesepakatan kelamin, ditandai pada berbagai benda leksikal dan bagian-dari-pidato (POS). Untuk mengatasi batasan ini, kami memperkaya MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) yang alami, sensitif-jenis dengan dua lapisan annotasi bahasa baru (POS dan rantai kesepakatan), dan mengeksplorasi seberapa besar kategori leksik berbeda dan fenomena kesepakatan terpengaruh oleh skews jenis. Fokus pada terjemahan pidato, kami melakukan evaluasi multifacet pada tiga arah bahasa (Inggris-Perancis/Italia/Spanyol), dengan model yang dilatih pada jumlah data yang berbeda dan teknik segmentasi kata yang berbeda. By shedding light on model behaviours, gender bias, and its detection at several levels of granularity, our findings emphasize the value of dedicated analyses beyond aggregated overall results.', 'de': 'Gender Bias wird weitgehend als problematisches Phänomen anerkannt, das Sprachtechnologien beeinflusst, wobei neuere Studien unterstreichen, dass es sich zwischen Sprachen unterschiedlich bemerkbar machen könnte. Die meisten derzeitigen Bewertungspraktiken konzentrieren sich jedoch auf Wortebene auf einen engen Satz beruflicher Substantive unter synthetischen Bedingungen. Solche Protokolle übersehen Schlüsselmerkmale grammatischer Geschlechtssprachen, die durch morphosyntaktische Ketten der Geschlechtervereinbarung gekennzeichnet sind, die auf einer Vielzahl von lexikalischen Elementen und Sprachteilen (POS) gekennzeichnet sind. Um diese Einschränkung zu überwinden, bereichern wir den natürlichen, geschlechtsspezifischen MuST-SHE-Korpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) um zwei neue linguistische Annotationsebenen (POS und Agreement Chains) und erforschen, inwieweit unterschiedliche lexikalische Kategorien und Übereinstimmungsphänomene durch Gender Skews beeinflusst werden. Mit dem Schwerpunkt Sprachübersetzung führen wir eine facettenreiche Evaluation in drei Sprachrichtungen (Englisch-Französisch/Italienisch/Spanisch) durch, wobei Modelle auf unterschiedlichen Datenmengen und verschiedenen Wortsegmentierungstechniken trainiert werden. Indem wir Modellverhalten, Gender Bias und deren Erkennung auf mehreren Granularitätsebenen beleuchten, unterstreichen unsere Ergebnisse den Wert dedizierter Analysen jenseits aggregierter Gesamtergebnisse.', 'sw': 'Ubaguzi wa jinsia unatambuliwa sana kama jambo tatizo linaloathiri teknolojia ya lugha, na tafiti za hivi karibuni zinaonyesha kuwa inaweza kuonekana tofauti katika lugha mbalimbali. Hata hivyo, shughuli nyingi za tathmini za sasa zinatumia lengo la neno linalohusiana na mfululizo mdogo wa vifaa vya ajira chini ya mazingira ya pamoja. Miradi kama hizi hupuuza vipengele vya lugha za kijinsia, ambazo huhusishwa na mfumo wa makubaliano ya kijinsia, ulioandikwa kwenye vitu mbalimbali vya lexico na sehemu mbalimbali za hotuba (POS). Ili kushinda mipaka hii, tunatajirisha makampuni ya asilia, yenye hisia za kijinsia na MuST-SHE (Bentivogli et al, 2020) na vipande viwili vipya vya uchunguzi wa lugha (POS na makubaliano), na kuchunguza kwa kiasi gani makundi tofauti na makubaliano yanavyoathirika na michoro ya kijinsia. Kwa kutangaza tafsiri ya hotuba, tunafanya tafiti mbalimbali kwenye maelekezo matatu ya lugha (Kiingereza-Kifaransa/Kiitalia/Kihispania), ambapo mifano imefundishwa kwa kiasi kikubwa cha taarifa na teknolojia tofauti za kutenganisha maneno. Kwa kuonyesha mwangaza juu ya tabia za mifano, upendeleo wa kijinsia, na utambuzi wake katika ngazi kadhaa za uchunguzi, matokeo yetu yanasisitiza thamani ya uchambuzi maalum zaidi ya matokeo yote yaliyotokana na uchunguzi.', 'ko': '성별 편견은 어느 정도 언어 기술에 영향을 미치는 문제가 있는 현상으로 여겨지는데, 최근 연구에 따르면 성별 편견은 서로 다른 언어에서 표현될 수 있다고 강조한다.그러나 현재의 대다수 평가 실천은 합성 조건에서 좁은 직업 명사에 대해 단어급의 관심을 갖는 것이다.이러한 프로토콜은 성별이 일치하는 형태의 문법 체인으로 각종 어휘 항목과 어성(POS)에 표시된 문법적 언어의 관건적인 특징을 무시했다.이러한 한계를 극복하기 위해 우리는 두 개의 새로운 언어 주석층(어성과 일치성 체인)으로 자연스럽고 성별에 민감한 MuST-SHE 어료 라이브러리(Bentivogli et al., 2020)를 풍부하게 하고 서로 다른 어휘 유형과 일치성 현상이 어느 정도 성별의 기울어진 영향을 받는지 탐색한다.음성 번역을 중점으로 하여 우리는 세 가지 언어 방향(영어-프랑스어/이탈리아어/스페인어)에 대해 다방면으로 평가했고 모델은 서로 다른 데이터량과 서로 다른 분사 기술에 따라 훈련했다.모델 행위, 성별 편견과 여러 입도 단계에서의 검측을 제시함으로써 우리의 연구결과는 전체적인 결과를 종합하는 것 이외의 전문적인 분석의 가치를 강조했다.', 'tr': 'Ýolňyz sowgatlary adatça dil teknolojilerini etjek kynçylyklary diýip tanalýar. Ýakynda öwrenmeler dilleriň arasynda başga görnüşi mümkin däldir. Ýöne häzirki deňlenme praktikalaryň köp bölegi sintetik şertlerde işleýän adlaryň gysga bir toparyna üns berýär. Beýleki protokollar gramatik jenaýat dilleriniň a çyk özelliklerine garaşýar, leňk sözleriniň birnäçe görnüşi we çykyş bolan bölekleriniň (POS) tarapyndan karakterlerle edilýär. Bu limitiňi üstüne çykarmak üçin, MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) iki täze dil duýdurma düzümleri bilen baýlaşdyryp, leşik kategoriýalaryň we ylalaşyk düzümleriniň nähili çeşitli derejesini çözerip, jentiller çykaryplaryň tarapyndan täsirleşip barýarys. Çaltylyk terjimesine nähili möhüm bolup, üç dil gurlanyşynda (iňlisçe-fransuzça/italiýa/ispaňlýa) sany çykyp biljek we farklı söz segmentasy tekniklerinde örän nusgalar bar. Model davranışlary, jentiller biasy we onuň esasy birnäçe derejede üýtgetmegi üçin ýagtylygymyzy çykaryp, netijelerimiz çykyşymyzyň hökmünde täze analyzlaryň muňaryny ýygnaýar.', 'sq': 'Përparësia e gjinit njihet kryesisht si një fenomen problematik që ndikon në teknologjitë gjuhësore, me studimet e fundit që theksojnë se mund të mbikqyrë ndryshe nëpër gjuhë. However, most of current evaluation practices adopt a word-level focus on a narrow set of occupational nouns under synthetic conditions.  Protokollet e tilla harrojnë karakteristikat kryesore të gjuhëve gramatike gjinore, të cilat karakterizohen nga zinxhirët morfosintaktikë të marrëveshjes gjinore, të shënuar në një varietet të elementeve lexike dhe pjesëve të fjalimit (POS). Për të kapërcyer këtë kufizim, ne e pasurojmë MuST-SHE corpus natyror, të ndjeshëm ndaj gjinit (Bentivogli et al., 2020) me dy shtresa të reja gjuhësore të anotacionit (POS dhe zinxhirë marrëveshjeje) dhe eksplorojmë në se sa kategori të ndryshme lexike dhe fenomene marrëveshjeje ndikojnë nga skews gjinore. Duke u përqëndruar në përkthimin e fjalës, ne kryejmë një vlerësim shumë-faqe në tre drejtime gjuhësh (anglisht-francez/italian/spanjoll), me modele të trajnuar në sasi të ndryshme të të dhënave dhe teknika të ndryshme të segmentimit të fjalëve. Duke hedhur dritë mbi sjelljet e modelit, paragjykimet gjinore dhe zbulimin e saj në disa nivele të granularitetit, zbulimet tona theksojnë vlerën e analizave të përkushtuara përtej rezultateve të përgjithshme të agreguara.', 'fa': 'با تحقیقات اخیرا که می\u200cتواند در زبان\u200cها به صورت مختلف روی روی روی روی صحنه\u200cهای جنسی تأثیر دهد، بسیار مشکلی است که تأثیر تکنولوژی\u200cهای زبان می\u200cدهد. ولی بیشتر عملیات ارزیابی فعلی یک سطح کلمه را روی یک مجموعه تنگ نام شغل در شرایط سنتراتیک پذیرفته می\u200cکند. این پروتکل\u200cها ویژگی\u200cهای کلیدی از زبان\u200cهای گراماتیک جنسی را فراموش می\u200cکنند، که با زنجیرهای مورفوسینتیک از توافق جنسی تعریف می\u200cکنند، که روی کلیدی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و بخش\u200cهای سخنرانی (POS) نشان داده می\u200cشوند. برای تغییر این محدودیت، ما شرکت طبیعی و حساس جنسی MuST-SHE (Bentivogli et al., 2020) را با دو لایه نوشته\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی جدید (POS و زنجیرهای موافقت) ثروت می\u200cکنیم، و به چه اندازه گونه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و پدیده\u200cهای موافقت که توسط سنگ\u200cهای جنسی تأثیر می\u200cدهند، تحقی با توجه به ترجمه سخنرانی، ما یک ارزیابی متفاوت در سه راه زبان (انگلیسی-فرانسوی/ایتالیایی/اسپانیایی/اسپانیایی) انجام می\u200cدهیم، با مدل\u200cهای آموزش داده\u200cهای متفاوت و تکنیک جدا کردن کلمات متفاوت. با تغییر نور روی رفتارهای مدل، پیشرفت جنسی و کشف آن در چند سطح بزرگی، نتیجه\u200cهای ما ارزش تحلیل\u200cهای مخصوص را بیشتر از نتیجه\u200cهای کلی جمع می\u200cکنند.', 'af': "Gender bias is groot herken as 'n problematiese fenomen wat die taal tegnologie beïnvloor, met onlangse studie wat onderskryf dat dit anders kan oorspronk oor tale. Maar die meeste van huidige evalueringspraksies aanvaar 'n woord-vlak fokus op 'n sterk stel van professionele noume onder sintetiese voorwaardes. Hierdie protokolle oorskou sleutel funksies van grammatiese geneem tale, wat karakteriseer word deur morfosyntaktike kettings van geneem ooreenkoms, gemerk op 'n verskillende leksiese items en dele-van-spreek (POS). Om hierdie beperking te oorwerp, ryk ons die natuurlike, gende-sensitiewe MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) met twee nuwe lingwisiese annotasie laag (POS en ooreenkomskettings) en uitsoek tot wat verskillende leksiekategorie en ooreenkomste fenomene deur geneemskare skewe invloek word. As ons gefokus op spraak vertaling, doen ons 'n multifaceted evaluering op drie taal rigtings (Engels-Frans/Italiese/Spaanse), met modele onderwerp op verskillende hoeveelheid data en verskillende woord segmentasie tekenieke. Deur die lig op model gedrag, geneemgeweldigheid en sy opdekking op verskeie vlakke van granulariteit, ons gevinde bepaal die waarde van besonderhede analiseerde buite agtergroot oorspronklike resultate.", 'am': 'የዝሙት ብልሃት ቋንቋዎች የቴክኖሎጂዎችን የሚያስጨንቅ የጭንቀት አካባቢ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ ማስታወቂያ ሥራ ብዙዎቹ በተስማማማዊ ጉዳይ ላይ የሚቆጠሩ የስራ አካባቢዎች ላይ የቃላት ደረጃን ትኩረት ይያዛሉ፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉት ፕሮግራሞች የቋንቋዎች ቁልፎች የግራማዊ የሥጋዊ ቋንቋዎች እና በዓይነት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃ እና የንግግር ክፍሎች ላይ የተመሳሳይ የሴት ሰንሰለቶች በሚያስተካክሉ ማህበረሰብ ላይ ይተዋል፡፡ ይህንን ግንኙነት ለማሸንፍ፣ የባሕላዊ፣ የሴት-SHE ኮርፓስ (Bentivogli et al., 2020) እና ሁለት አዲስ የቋንቋዊ ማስታወቂያ ደረጃዎች (POS እና agreement ሰንሰለቶች) እና ለልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች እና ውይይት የውይይት ግንኙነት ምን ያህል ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በንግግር ትርጓሜ ላይ በመጠቀም፣ በሦስት ቋንቋ መንገዶች (እንግሊዘኛ-ፈረንሳይ/ጣሊያንኛ/ስፓኒሽ)፣ በተለየ የዳታ እና በተለየ ቃላት ግንኙነት እና በተለየ የንግግር ግንኙነት ማህበረሰብ ላይ የተማሩ ሞዴላዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሞዴል ሁኔታ፣ የሴት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች እና ግንኙነታችንን በማሳየት፣ ፍጥረታችን ከሙሉ ፍጥረቶች በላይ የተለየውን ትምህርት የሚያሳውቀው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Սկնդի կողմնականությունը հիմնականում ընդունվում է որպես լեզվի տեխնոլոգիաներին ազդում խնդիր ունեցող երևույթ, որտեղ վերջին ուսումնասիրությունները նշանակում են, որ այն կարող է տարբեր կերպ գտնվել լեզուներում: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս գնահատման գործողությունների մեծամասնությունը ընդունում է բառի մակարդակի կենտրոնացումը սինթետիկ պայմաններում մասնագիտական անունների խիստ խումբի վրա: Այս պրոտոկոլները անտեսում են գրամատիկ գենդերային լեզուների հիմնական հատկությունները, որոնք բնորոշվում են գենդերային համաձայնության մորֆոսինտակտիկ շղթաներով, որոնք նշված են լեքսիկական տարրերի և խոսքի մասերի (POS) վրա: Այս սահմանափակումները հաղթահարելու համար մենք հարստացնում ենք բնական, գենդերային զգացմունքը զգացմունքներ ունեցող ՄՈՍԹ-ՇԵ կորպոսը (Բենտիվոգլին և այլն., 2020 թ․) երկու նոր լեզվաբանական նոտացիոն շերտերով (POS և համաձայնության շղթաներով), և ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչքանով Մենք կենտրոնացնում ենք խոսքի թարգմանման վրա, մենք կատարում ենք բազմատեսակ գնահատում երեք լեզվի ուղղությունների վրա (անգլերեն-ֆրանսերեն, իսպաներեն, իսպաներեն), մոդելների վրա, որոնք պատրաստված են տարբեր տվյալների քանակությամբ Մոդելի վարքագծի, գենդերային կողմնականության և դրա հայտնաբերման միջոցով մեր հայտնաբերությունները շեշտում են նվիրված վերլուծությունների արժեքը, որը հակառակ է համաշխարհային արդյունքներից:', 'bn': 'ভাষার প্রযুক্তির উপর প্রভাবিত একটি সমস্যাত বিষয় হিসেবে লিঙ্গ বিবেচনা করা হয়েছে, সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণাগুলো নিশ্চিত করেছে যে এটি ভাষার ভি তবে বর্তমান মূল্যের বেশীরভাগ ব্যবস্থা সিন্টেটিক পরিস্থিতির উপর একটি শব্দ-স্তরে মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। এই ধরনের প্রোটোকল গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল লিঙ্গ ভাষার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী চুক্তি দ্বারা চিহ্নিত, যা বিভিন্ন লেক্সিকাল জ এই সীমাবদ্ধ করার জন্য আমরা প্রাকৃতিক, লিঙ্গ-সংবেদনশীল মুস্টি-এসএই কোর্পাস (বেন্টিভিওগ্লি এল, ২০২০) দুটি নতুন ভাষার শিল্পের সাথে সমৃদ্ধ করি এবং লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল বিভিন্ন বিভিন ভাষণ অনুবাদের ব্যাপারে মনোযোগ দিয়ে আমরা তিন ভাষার দিকে (ইংরেজি-ফরাসী/ইতালিয়ান/স্প্যানিশ) বিভিন্ন তথ্য এবং বিভিন্ন শব্দ বিভিন্ন ভাষার প্ মডেলের আচরণ, লিঙ্গ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন পর্যায়ে আলোক প্রদর্শনের মাধ্যমে আমাদের খুঁজে পাওয়া যায়, সারা ফলাফলের বাইরে বিশেষ বিশ্লেষণের মূল্য উল্লেখ', 'ca': "El bias de gènere es reconeix en gran part com un fenomen problemàtic que afecta les tecnologies lingüístices, amb estudis recents subrayant que podria superar de manera diferent a través de les llengües. Tot i així, la majoria de pràctiques d'evaluació actuals adopten un enfocament a nivell de paraules en un conjunt estret de noms ocupacionals en condicions sintètiques. Such protocols overlook key features of grammatical gender languages, which are characterized by morphosyntactic chains of gender agreement, marked on a variety of lexical items and parts-of-speech (POS).  Per superar aquesta limitació, enriquecem el corpus MuST-SHE natural i sensible al gènere (Bentivogli et al., 2020) amb dues noves capes d'anotació lingüística (POS i cadenes d'acords), i explorem en quin punt diferents categories lècsiques i fenomens d'acord estan afectats pels esboços de gènere. En centrar-nos en la traducció del discurs, fem una evaluació multifacetada en tres direccions lingüístices (anglès-francès/italià/espanyol), amb models entrenats en quantitats variades de dades i tècniques de segmentació de paraules diferents. Al deixar llum sobre els comportaments models, el bias de gènere i la seva detecció a diversos nivells de granularitat, els nostres descobriments destaquen el valor d'anàlisis dedicades més enllà dels resultats globals agregats.", 'az': 'C…ônn…ôt t…ôrzl…ôrini dil teknolojil…ôrin…ô t…ôsir ed…ôn problematik bir fenomen kimi tanńĪnmńĪŇüdńĪr. Son t…ôrzl…ôrind…ô t…ôrzl…ôrinin dill…ôrin arasńĪnda f…ôrqli t…ôrzl…ôrin √ľz…ôrind…ô √ľz…ô √ßńĪxmasńĪnńĪ anlamńĪŇüdńĪr. Lakin, Ňüimdiki deńüerlendirm…ô praksil…ôrinin √ßoxu sintetik ŇüartlarńĪ altńĪnda s√∂zl…ôrin s…ôviyy…ôsin…ô baxmayaraq, s√∂zl…ôrin s…ôviyy…ôsini sintetik m…ôqs…ôdil…ô √ß…ôkilm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôsirl…ôndirir. B√ľt√ľn protokollar gramatik cins dill…ôrinin anahtar √∂zellikl…ôrin…ô baxńĪr, cins anlaŇümasńĪ morphosyntaktik z…ôncirl…ôri il…ô tanńĪdńĪrlar, bir √ßoxlu leksik v…ô s√∂zl…ôrin par√ßalarńĪnńĪ (POS) il…ô iŇüar…ô edilmiŇüdir. Bu limiti √ľst√ľn etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, biz t…ôbi…ôtli, cins-sensitiv MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) iki yeni dilli annotation layers (POS v…ô anlaŇüma zinciri) il…ô z…ônginl…ôndirdik v…ô cins skews tarafńĪndan n…ô q…ôd…ôr m√ľxt…ôlif leŇüik kategoriyalarńĪ v…ô anlaŇüma par√ßalarńĪnńĪn t…ôsir edildiyini araŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq. S√∂zl√ľk terc√ľm…ôtin…ô t…ôsirli olaraq, biz √ľ√ß dil t…ôr…ôfl…ôrind…ô √ßoxlu t…ôsirli t…ôsiri etdik (ńįngilizce-FransńĪz/ńįtalyan/ńįspanyol/ńįspanyol/ńįngilizce-FransńĪz/ńįspanyol/ńįngilizce-ńįspanyol/ńįngilizce-FransńĪz/ńįspanyol dili t…ôr…ôfl…ôrin Model davranńĪŇülarńĪna, cins t…ôrzl…ôrin…ô v…ô bunlarńĪn √ßoxlu s…ôviyy…ôd…ô granularńĪlńĪq t…ôŇükil edilm…ôsin…ô g√∂r…ô, tapńĪlarńĪmńĪz t…ôŇükil edilmiŇü analizl…ôrin qiym…ôtini t…ôsdiql…ôyir.', 'bs': 'Ženska predrasuda se uglavnom priznaje kao problematični fenomen koji utječe na jezičke tehnologije, s nedavnim ispitivanjima koje potvrđuju da bi se moglo drugačije površiti na jezicima. Međutim, većina trenutnih prakse procjene usvojila je koncentraciju na razini riječi na usku skupu profesionalnih imena pod sintetičkim uvjetima. Takvi protokoli pregledaju ključne karakteristike gramatičkih spolnih jezika, koje karakteriziraju morfosintaktički lanci spolnog sporazuma, označene na raznim leksičkim predmetima i dijelovima govora (POS). Da bi preuzeli ovu ograničenje, obogatili smo prirodni, osjetljivi muST-SHE korpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) sa dvije nove slojeve jezičke annotacije (POS i lance sporazuma), i istražili u kakvoj mjeri različite leksičke kategorije i fenomene sporazuma utjecaju na spolne košulje. Fokusirajući se na prevod govora, vodimo višestruku procjenu o tri jezičke upute (engleski-francuski/italijanski/španjolski), s modelima obučenim na različitim količinama podataka i različitim tehnikama segmentacije riječi. Izbacivanjem svjetla na model ponašanja, spolne predrasude i njegovo otkrivanje na nekoliko nivoa granularnosti, naši nalazi naglašavaju vrijednost posvećenih analiza izvan aggregativnih ukupnih rezultata.', 'cs': 'Genderová zaujatost je do značné míry uznávána jako problematický jev ovlivňující jazykové technologie, přičemž nedávné studie zdůrazňují, že se může v různých jazycích objevovat odlišně. Většina současných hodnotících postupů se však zaměřuje na úroveň slov na úzký soubor profesních podstatných jmen za syntetických podmínek. Tyto protokoly přehlížejí klíčové rysy gramatických genderových jazyků, které jsou charakterizovány morfosyntaktickými řetězci genderové shody, označenými na různých lexikálních položkách a částech řeči (POS). Abychom toto omezení překonali, obohacujeme přirozený, genderově citlivý korpus MuST-SHE (Bentivogli et al., 2020) o dvě nové jazykové anotační vrstvy (POS a dohodové řetězce) a zkoumáme, do jaké míry jsou různé lexikální kategorie a jevy dohody ovlivněny genderovými pochyby. Zaměřením se na překlad řeči provádíme mnohostranné hodnocení tří jazykových směrů (anglicko-francouzština/italština/španělština), s modely trénované na různém množství dat a různých technik segmentace slov. Naše zjištění zdůrazňují hodnotu specializovaných analýz nad rámec agregovaných celkových výsledků.', 'et': 'Soolist eelarvamust peetakse suuresti keeltehnoloogiat mõjutavaks probleemseks nähtuseks, kusjuures hiljutised uuringud rõhutavad, et see võib keeltes erinevalt esile kerkida. Enamik praegustest hindamistavadest keskendub aga sõnatasemel kitsastele kutselistele nimisõnadele sünteetilistes tingimustes. Sellised protokollid jätavad tähelepanuta grammatiliste sookeelte põhijooned, mida iseloomustavad soolise kokkuleppe morfosüntaktilised ahelad, mis on märgitud erinevatele leksikaalsetele elementidele ja kõneosadele (POS). Selle piirangu ületamiseks rikastame looduslikku sootundlikku MuST-SHE korpust (Bentivogli jt., 2020) kahe uue keelelise annotatsioonikihiga (POS ja kokkuleppeahelad) ning uurime, mil määral erinevaid leksikaalseid kategooriaid ja kokkuleppenähtusi mõjutavad sookõrvalekalded. Keskendudes kõnetõlkele, teostame mitmekülgse hindamise kolmes keelesuunas (inglise-prantsuse/itaalia/hispaania), kus mudelid on koolitatud erinevate andmekoguste ja erinevate sõnasegmenteerimise meetoditega. Valgustades mudeli käitumist, soolise eelarvamuse ja selle tuvastamist mitmel granulaarsuse tasemel, rõhutavad meie tulemused spetsiaalsete analüüside väärtust lisaks koondtulemustele.', 'fi': 'Sukupuolten ennakkoluulo tunnustetaan pitkälti kieliteknologioihin vaikuttavaksi ongelmalliseksi ilmiöksi, ja viimeaikaiset tutkimukset korostavat, että se saattaa esiintyä eri kielillä. Useimmissa nykyisissä arviointikäytännöissä keskitytään kuitenkin sanatasolla kapeaan ammattisubstantiivien joukkoon synteettisissä olosuhteissa. Tällaiset protokollat jättävät huomiotta kielioppisten sukupuolikielten keskeiset piirteet, joille on ominaista morfosyntaktiset sukupuolisopusoinnun ketjut, jotka on merkitty erilaisiin sanastoihin ja puheen osiin (POS). Tämän rajoituksen voittamiseksi rikastamme luonnollista, sukupuoliherkkää MuST-SHE-korpusta (Bentivogli et al., 2020) kahdella uudella kielellisellä annotointikerroksella (POS ja sopimusketjut) ja tutkimme, missä määrin sukupuolivääristymät vaikuttavat eri sanastoluokkiin ja sopimusilmiöihin. Puheen kääntämiseen keskittyen suoritamme moniulotteisen arvioinnin kolmesta eri kielisuunnasta (englanti-ranska/italia/espanja), joissa mallinnetaan erilaisia tietomääriä ja eri sanasegmentointitekniikoita. Valaisemalla mallikäyttäytymistä, sukupuoliharhaa ja sen havaitsemista useilla tarkkuustasoilla havainnomme korostavat erityisanalyysien arvoa yhdistettyjen kokonaistulosten lisäksi.', 'jv': 'Slamet politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ato protokol sing berarti akeh akeh akeh sampeyan akeh ning langgar gar sampeyan gejer Ngawe nggoleki perusahaan iki, kita anggadahi mênêr-jutakan gar-akeh sabên, génêr-jutêr Must-SSE Body (Bentitiogi et al.2020) ngangge sistem sing gawe nyimpen langkung duwé (po S lan nampek kejahatan), lan ndhekasara awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan akeh luwih dumadhi iki ngono kuwi nggawe barang ileksi iki. Ngawe ngubah tarjamahan, kita dadi karo akeh banter sampek karo telu oleh dumateng (ingles-French/italian/Spanish), lan akeh model sing ditulak banter sampek akeh dadi lan teknik sing dadi sampek. Ngawe ki jenis-jenis ngilanggar nganggo perusahaan model, gewis biasane, lan ijol-ijolan winih hayo sing ngedol kuwi tindog granularity, awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe Perintah dhéwé kuwi gek dhéwé sing paling beraksi yang cukup.', 'he': 'ההתמחות הגברית מוכרת בעיקר כתופעה בעייתית שמשפיעה על טכנולוגיות שפת, עם מחקרים לאחרונה שמרמזים כי היא עלולה להשפיע בצורה שונה בכל שפות. עם זאת, רוב מערכות הערכה הנוכחיות מאמצות התמקדות ברמה מילים על קבוצה צרה של שמות מקצועיות בתנאים סינטטיים. פרוטוקולים כאלה מתעלמים מאפיינים מפתחיים של שפות גזע גרמטיות, שמתאימות על ידי שרשרות מורפוסינטקטיות של הסכם גזע, מסומנות על מגוון של פריטים לקסיים וחלקים של נאום (POS). כדי להתגבר על ההגבלה הזאת, אנחנו מעשירים את MuST-SHE corpus הטבעי, רגיש למין (Bentivogli et al., 2020) עם שתי שכבות ציונים לשפתיים חדשות (POS ושרשרת הסכם), ולחקור עד כמה קטגוריות לקסיות שונות ותופעות הסכם משפיעות על ידי סקוי מין. מתמקדים בתרגום הנאום, אנו מבצעים עריכה מרובה-פנים על שלושה כיוונים לשפה (אנגלית-צרפתית/איטלקית/ספרדית), עם דוגמנים מאומנים על כמויות שונות של נתונים וטכניקות שיתוף מילים שונות. על ידי השליך אור על התנהגות מודל, ההתמחות מינית, והגילוי שלה במספר רמות של גרנוליות, הממצאים שלנו מזכירים את הערך של ניתוחים מוקדשים מעבר לתוצאות כלליות מורכבות.', 'sk': 'Spolna pristranskost je večinoma priznana kot problematičen pojav, ki vpliva na jezikovne tehnologije, nedavne študije pa poudarjajo, da se lahko pojavi različno med jeziki. Vendar se večina sedanjih ocenjevalnih praks osredotoča na ozek nabor poklicnih samostalnikov v sintetičnih pogojih. Takšni protokoli spregledajo ključne značilnosti slovničnih spolnih jezikov, za katere so značilne morfosintaktične verige spolnega dogovora, označene na različnih leksikalnih elementih in delih govora (POS). Da bi premagali to omejitev, bogatimo naravni, spolno občutljiv korpus MuST-SHE (Bentivogli et al., 2020) z dvema novima slojema jezikovnih opomb (POS in dogovorjene verige) ter raziskali, v kolikšni meri vplivajo na različne leksikalne kategorije in dogovorjene pojave spolov. S poudarkom na govornem prevajanju izvajamo večplastno vrednotenje v treh jezikovnih smereh (angleško-francoščina/italijanščina/španščina), pri čemer so modeli usposobljeni za različne količine podatkov in različne tehnike segmentacije besed. Z osvetlitvijo vedenja modela, pristranskosti spola in njegovega odkrivanja na več ravneh granularnosti naša ugotovitev poudarja vrednost namenskih analiz, ki presegajo skupne rezultate.', 'ha': "Ana gane suriyar jini kamar wani abu mai matsãta ne wanda ke yi amfani da technical na harshe, da karatun na farko, yana ƙara cẽwa, za ta samar da shi a cikin wasu harshe dabam-dabam. A lokacin da, mafi yawansu da ke aikin evaluation yanzu, suna ɗau wata magana-daraja zura fokus a kan wani tsarin nau'i masu sauri na aikin aiki a ƙarƙashin mazaɓa. Waɗancan shiryoyin ayuka na ƙẽtare ƙayyade masu cikin harshen jinin grammati, waɗand a ke ƙayyade su da wasu nau'i na mutane, da aka yi wa alama a cikin wasu abubuwa na leksisi da rabon magana (PSS). To overcome this limitation, we enrich the natural, gender-sensitive MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) with two new linguistic annotation layers (POS and agreement chains), and explore to what extent different lexical categories and agreement phenomena are impacted by gender skews.  Yana da amfani da fassarar magana, Munã tafiyar da an ƙaddara masu yawa a kan shiryoyin harshe uku (Ingiriya-French/Italian/spanish), da misãlai wanda aka yi wa wa'anar ko-nau'in data da kuma masu diƙayyade kalmõmi dabam-dabam. Ga ku nuna haske a kan abun misãlai, biyar jini da gane shi a cikin daraja guda, misãlai masu ƙayyade kimar da aka ƙayyade haske a kan fassarar duk.", 'bo': 'དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲུ་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ཆེས་ཤུགས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཉེ་ཆར་གྱི་བརྗོད་ལ་ ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོའི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་དག་གིས་ཚོགས་སྦྲེལ་བའི་མིང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Such protocols overlook key features of grammatical gender languages, which are characterized by morphosyntactic chains of gender agreement, marked on a variety of lexical items and parts-of-speech (POS). To overcome this limitation, we enrich the natural, gender-sensitive MuST-SHE corpus (Bentivogli et al., 2020) with two new linguistic annotation layers (POS and agreement chains), and explore to what extent different lexical categories and agreement phenomena are impacted by gender skews. Focusing on speech translation, we conduct a multifaced evaluation on three language directions (English-French/Italian/Spanish), with models trained on varying amounts of data and different word segmentation techniques. In English-French/Italian/Spanish, we conduct a multifaced evaluation on three languages directions. Through shedding light on model behavior, gender bias, and its detection at several levels of granularity, our findings emphasize the value of dedicated analyses beyond aggregated overall results.'}
{'en': 'Make the Best of Cross-lingual Transfer: Evidence from ', 'ar': 'الإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح متعدد الإجابات من خلال إطار عمل الاسترداد ثم التحقق', 'pt': 'Respondendo a perguntas de várias respostas de domínio aberto por meio de uma estrutura de recall e verificação', 'es': 'Respuesta a preguntas de múltiples respuestas de dominio abierto a través de un marco de recuperación y verificación', 'fr': 'Répondre à des questions à réponses multiples dans le domaine ouvert via un cadre de rappel puis vérification', 'zh': '召还验框架对开域多对', 'hi': 'एक रिकॉल-फिर-सत्यापित करें फ्रेमवर्क के माध्यम से ओपन-डोमेन मल्टी-उत्तर प्रश्नों का उत्तर देना', 'ja': 'リコール-その後-検証フレームワークを介したオープンドメインの複数回答の質問への回答', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы с несколькими ответами в открытом домене с помощью механизма Recall-then-Verify', 'ga': 'Ag Freagairt Ceisteanna Ilfhreagartha Fearainn Oscailte trí Chreat Athghairm-agus Ansin-Fíoraigh', 'el': 'Απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών απαντήσεων ανοιχτού τομέα μέσω ενός πλαισίου ανάκλησης και επαλήθευσης', 'ka': 'გახსნა დიომინის მრავალური პასუხების გადასწორება შემდეგ გადასწორება', 'hu': 'Nyitott tartományos többválaszos kérdések megválaszolása visszahívás, majd ellenőrzés keretrendszeren keresztül', 'lt': 'Atsakymai į atviro domeno klausimus, į kuriuos atsakoma keliais atsakymais naudojant atšaukimo, tada tikrinimo sistemą', 'it': 'Rispondere alle domande con risposta multipla a dominio aperto tramite un framework Recall-then-Verify', 'mk': 'Одговарање на прашањата на отворен домен со повеќе одговори преку рамка за повторно повторно потоа верификување', 'kk': 'Open- Domain көп- жауап сұрақтарын қайталау жұмысын тексеру арқылы жауап беру', 'ms': 'Jawab soalan-jawapan berbilang-domain terbuka melalui kerangka Ulang-Kemudian-Sahkan', 'ml': 'തുറക്കുന്ന ഡൊമെയില്\u200d പല- ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുക', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’risposti multipli ta’ dominju miftuħ permezz ta’ Qafas ta’ Verifika ta’ Riċekkjar imbagħad', 'mn': 'Хариулт нээлттэй холбоотой олон хариултын асуултуудыг дахин дахин дахин шалгах', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări cu mai multe răspunsuri în domeniu deschis printr-un cadru Recall-then-Verificare', 'pl': 'Odpowiadanie na pytania z wieloma odpowiedziami w otwartej domenie za pomocą frameworku Recall-then-Verify', 'sr': 'Odgovor na otvorene domene višeodgovorne pitanja putem provjere okvira', 'no': 'Svar på fleire svarspørsmål med opna domene via eit rekoll- og så- kontroll rammeverk', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාර කරනවා විතරයි.', 'sv': 'Svara på frågor med flera svar på öppna domäner via ett ramverk för återkallande och verifiering', 'so': 'Jawaabta jawaabta waqtiga furan ee jawaabta badan via a Recall-then-veri Framework', 'ur': 'Open Domain Multi-Answer Questions via a Recall-Then-Verify Framework', 'ta': 'திறந்த பதில் பதில் கேள்விகள் மறுபடியும் பின்னர் சரிபார்ப்பு சட்டத்தின் மூலம்', 'uz': 'Answering Open-Domain Multi-Answer Questions via a Recall-then-Verify Framework', 'vi': 'Trả lời câu hỏi đa miền mở thông qua bộ khung kiểm tra', 'nl': 'Open-domein multi-answer vragen beantwoorden via een Recall-then-Verify Framework', 'da': 'Besvarelse af flere spørgsmål med åbent domæne via en ramme tilbagekaldelse og bekræftelse', 'bg': 'Отговаряне на въпроси с множество отговори с отворен домейн чрез рамка за връщане и потвърждение', 'hr': 'Odgovor otvorenog domena višeodgovornih pitanja putem okvira ponovnog provjere', 'de': 'Beantworten von Open-Domain Multi-Answer-Fragen über ein Recall-then-Verify Framework', 'ko': '리콜 및 프레임워크 검증을 통해 개방형 다중 응답', 'id': 'Jawab Pertanyaan Multi-Jawaban Domain Buka melalui Framework Recall-then-Verify', 'fa': 'پاسخ دادن سؤال\u200cهای بسیار پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی دامنه باز\u200cشده با طریق یک چهارچوب\u200cهای بازیابی و پس بررسی', 'sw': 'Jibu maswali mengi ya kujibu huru ya Domain kupitia Mfumo wa Kuchunguza', 'tr': 'Aç-alan köp-jogabat soraglary bir Taýtalan-soňra-Dönüş Çerçivelerini Doğrula', 'sq': 'Përgjigja pyetjeve me përgjigje të shumëfishta të dominit të hapur nëpërmjet një kuadri të rikthyes-pastaj-verifikimit', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'af': "Antwoord Open- Domein Veelvuldige- Antwoord Vragate deur 'n Herhaal- dan- Verifiseer Raamwerk", 'hy': 'Հարձագանքը բաց բնագավառի բազմապատասխանների հարցերի միջոցով', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদান করা হচ্ছে একটি পুনরায়- পরীক্ষা করা ফ্রেমের মাধ্যমে', 'bs': 'Odgovor na pitanja koje su otvorene domene višeodgovorne putem provjere okvira', 'az': 'Açıq-Domain çox-cavab suallarını bir Yeniden-sonra-Dönüş Çerçivi vasitəsilə cavab verir', 'ca': "Respondre a preguntes multirespostes de domini obert a través d'un marc de recuperació i verificació", 'cs': 'Odpovědi na otázky s otevřenou doménou s více odpovědí prostřednictvím rámce Recall-then-Verify', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni mitme vastusega küsimustele vastamine tagasikutsumise ja kontrollimise raamistiku kaudu', 'fi': 'Avoimen verkkotunnuksen monivastauskysymyksiin vastaaminen palautus- ja vahvistuskehyksen avulla', 'jv': 'Ngubah Open-domain Multi-respons Galian Ngawe Resall-dan-Verificati Tampilan', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja odprte domene z več odgovori prek okvira za odpoklic in nato preverjanje', 'ha': 'Answering Open-Domain Multi-Answer Questions via a Recall-then-Verify Framework', 'he': 'עונה על שאלות מרובות תשובות בתחום פתוח באמצעות מסגרת חיזור-ואז-לבדוק', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དྲ་ཁོངས་ལ་མཐུན་སྣ་མཐུན་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་བསྐྱར་དུ་འཇུག་པ་དང་དུས་གཞུང་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual transfer learning with large multilingual pre-trained models can be an effective approach for low-resource languages with no labeled training data. Existing evaluations of zero-shot cross-lingual generalisability of large pre-trained models use datasets with English training data, and test data in a selection of target languages. We explore a more extensive transfer learning setup with 65 different source languages and 105 target languages for part-of-speech tagging. Through our analysis, we show that pre-training of both source and target language, as well as matching language families, writing systems, word order systems, and lexical-phonetic distance significantly impact cross-lingual performance. The findings described in this paper can be used as indicators of which factors are important for effective zero-shot cross-lingual transfer to zero- and low-resource languages.', 'ar': 'من المرجح أن تكون أسئلة المجال المفتوح مفتوحة وغامضة ، مما يؤدي إلى إجابات صحيحة متعددة. عادةً ما تتبنى الأساليب الحالية إطار إعادة التصنيف ثم القراءة ، حيث يقرأ القارئ الأدلة عالية المستوى للتنبؤ بالإجابات. وفقًا لتحليلنا التجريبي ، يواجه هذا الإطار ثلاث مشكلات: أولاً ، للاستفادة من قارئ كبير في ظل قيود الذاكرة ، يجب أن يختار القائم بإعادة التصنيف عددًا قليلاً فقط من المقاطع ذات الصلة لتغطية الإجابات المتنوعة ، في حين أن الموازنة بين الملاءمة والتنوع ليس بالأمر السهل ؛ ثانيًا ، تمنع ميزانية القراءة الصغيرة القارئ من الوصول إلى الأدلة القيمة المسترجعة التي تمت تصفيتها بواسطة إعادة التصنيف ؛ ثالثًا ، عند استخدام قارئ توليدي للتنبؤ بالإجابات دفعة واحدة استنادًا إلى جميع الأدلة المختارة ، فإن توقع إجابة صحيحة يعتمد أيضًا من الناحية المرضية على دليل على بعض الإجابات الصحيحة الأخرى. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقترح الإجابة على أسئلة المجال المفتوح متعددة الإجابات بإطار عمل استدعاء ثم التحقق ، والذي يفصل بين عملية التفكير لكل إجابة حتى نتمكن من الاستفادة بشكل أفضل من الأدلة المسترجعة مع الاستفادة أيضًا من النماذج الكبيرة في إطار نفس قيود الذاكرة. يحقق إطار العمل الخاص بنا أحدث النتائج على مجموعتي بيانات متعددة الإجابات ، ويتنبأ بإجابات ذهبية أكثر بكثير من نظام إعادة التصنيف ثم القراءة الذي يستخدم أداة إعادة تصنيف أوراكل.', 'fr': "Les questions de domaine ouvert sont susceptibles d'être ouvertes et ambiguës, ce qui donne lieu à de multiples réponses valides. Les approches existantes adoptent généralement le cadre de classement puis de lecture, dans lequel le lecteur lit des preuves de premier ordre pour prédire les réponses. Selon notre analyse empirique, ce cadre est confronté à trois problèmes\xa0: premièrement, pour tirer parti d'un grand lecteur soumis à une contrainte de mémoire, le reclassement ne doit sélectionner que quelques passages pertinents pour couvrir diverses réponses, tandis que l'équilibre entre pertinence et diversité n'est pas anodin\xa0; deuxièmement, le petit budget de lecture empêche le lecteur d'accéder à des preuves précieuses extraites filtrées par le reclassement\xa0; troisièmement, lorsqu'on utilise un lecteur génératif pour prédire les réponses en une seule fois sur la base de toutes les preuves sélectionnées, la question de savoir si une réponse valide sera prédite dépend également pathologiquement de la preuve d'une ou plusieurs autres réponses valides. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons de répondre à des questions à réponses multiples dans le domaine ouvert avec un cadre de rappel puis de vérification, qui sépare le processus de raisonnement de chaque réponse afin de pouvoir mieux utiliser les preuves récupérées tout en exploitant de grands modèles soumis à la même contrainte de mémoire. Notre framework permet d'obtenir des résultats de pointe sur deux ensembles de données à réponses multiples et prédit beaucoup plus de réponses Gold qu'un système de rerank-then read qui utilise un reranker Oracle.", 'es': 'Es probable que las preguntas de dominio abierto sean abiertas y ambiguas, lo que lleva a múltiples respuestas válidas. Los enfoques existentes generalmente adoptan el marco de volver a clasificar y luego leer, en el que un lector lee la evidencia de mayor rango para predecir las respuestas. Según nuestro análisis empírico, este marco se enfrenta a tres problemas: primero, para aprovechar un lector grande bajo una restricción de memoria, el reclasificador debe seleccionar solo unos pocos pasajes relevantes para cubrir diversas respuestas, mientras que equilibrar la relevancia y la diversidad no es trivial; segundo, el pequeño presupuesto de lectura impide el lector no acceda a la valiosa evidencia recuperada filtrada por el reclasificador; tercero, cuando se usa un lector generativo para predecir las respuestas de una vez en función de toda la evidencia seleccionada, si una respuesta válida será pronosticada también depende patológicamente de la evidencia de alguna otra (s) respuesta (s) válida (s). Para abordar estos problemas, proponemos responder a las preguntas de múltiples respuestas de dominio abierto con un marco de recordar y verificar, que separa el proceso de razonamiento de cada respuesta para que podamos hacer un mejor uso de la evidencia recuperada y, al mismo tiempo, aprovechar los modelos grandes con la misma restricción de memoria. Nuestro marco logra resultados de vanguardia en dos conjuntos de datos de múltiples respuestas y predice significativamente más respuestas de oro que un sistema de volver a organizar y luego leer que utiliza un reordenador de oráculo.', 'pt': 'As perguntas de domínio aberto provavelmente serão abertas e ambíguas, levando a várias respostas válidas. As abordagens existentes normalmente adotam a estrutura reclassificar e depois ler, em que um leitor lê evidências de alto nível para prever respostas. De acordo com nossa análise empírica, essa estrutura enfrenta três problemas: primeiro, para alavancar um grande leitor sob uma restrição de memória, o reclassificador deve selecionar apenas algumas passagens relevantes para cobrir diversas respostas, enquanto o equilíbrio entre relevância e diversidade não é trivial; segundo, o pequeno orçamento de leitura impede o leitor de acessar evidências valiosas recuperadas filtradas pelo reclassificador; terceiro, ao usar um leitor generativo para prever respostas de uma só vez com base em todas as evidências selecionadas, se uma resposta válida será prevista também patologicamente depende da evidência de alguma outra resposta válida. Para abordar essas questões, propomos responder a perguntas de múltiplas respostas de domínio aberto com uma estrutura de recuperação e verificação, que separa o processo de raciocínio de cada resposta para que possamos fazer melhor uso das evidências recuperadas e, ao mesmo tempo, alavancar grandes modelos sob o mesma restrição de memória. Nossa estrutura alcança resultados de última geração em dois conjuntos de dados de várias respostas e prevê significativamente mais respostas de ouro do que um sistema de reclassificação e leitura que usa um reclassificador oracle.', 'zh': '开域颇疑开放式与模棱,以致多效。 今有法常用先重名后读者框架,其读者读排名凭前证以占答案。 以吾实论之,此框架临三者:先于记约下用大读者,更择数相关段落以涵盖异对,而衡相关性多样性并非易事。 次读预算少,使读者不得重排名者过漉者有直证; 其三曰,当用生成阅读器以所有定证一次性占诸对案,病理学有效,亦决于他证。 为此者,请用一召而后验框架以对开放域多,框架分别其事,以便检索到证,同内存而用大体。 臣等框架于两多答案数据集上最先进,且占黄金答案较多于用oracle重排名器者重排而后读取系统。', 'ru': 'Вопросы открытого домена, скорее всего, будут открытыми и двусмысленными, что приведет к множеству правильных ответов. Существующие подходы, как правило, принимают фреймворк rerank-then-read, где читатель читает первоклассные доказательства, чтобы предсказать ответы. Согласно нашему эмпирическому анализу, эта структура сталкивается с тремя проблемами: во-первых, чтобы использовать большой читатель при ограничении памяти, реранкеру следует выбрать только несколько соответствующих отрывков, чтобы охватить различные ответы, в то время как балансировка релевантности и разнообразия нетривиальна; во-вторых, небольшой бюджет на чтение не позволяет читателю получить доступ к ценным извлеченным доказательствам, отфильтрованным реранкером; в-третьих, при использовании генеративного читателя для прогнозирования ответов сразу на основе всех выбранных доказательств, будет ли правильный ответ предсказан также патологически зависит от доказательств некоторых других действительных ответов. Чтобы решить эти проблемы, мы предлагаем ответить на вопросы с несколькими ответами в открытых доменах с помощью механизма «вспомните, затем проверьте», который разделяет процесс рассуждения каждого ответа, чтобы мы могли лучше использовать полученные доказательства, а также использовать крупные модели при одном и том же ограничении памяти. Наш фреймворк достигает самых современных результатов на двух наборах данных с несколькими ответами и предсказывает значительно больше золотых ответов, чем система повторного ранжирования, использующая оракул повторного ранжирования.', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन प्रश्नों के ओपन-एंडेड और अस्पष्ट होने की संभावना है, जिससे कई मान्य उत्तर मिलते हैं। मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण आमतौर पर रीरैंक-फिर-रीड फ्रेमवर्क को अपनाते हैं, जहां एक पाठक उत्तरों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए शीर्ष रैंकिंग सबूत पढ़ता है। हमारे अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण के अनुसार, इस ढांचे को तीन समस्याओं का सामना करना पड़ता है: सबसे पहले, स्मृति बाधा के तहत एक बड़े पाठक का लाभ उठाने के लिए, रीरैंकर को विविध उत्तरों को कवर करने के लिए केवल कुछ प्रासंगिक मार्गों का चयन करना चाहिए, जबकि प्रासंगिकता और विविधता को संतुलित करना गैर-तुच्छ है; दूसरा, छोटे पढ़ने का बजट पाठक को पुनः प्रैंकर द्वारा फ़िल्टर किए गए मूल्यवान पुनर्प्राप्त साक्ष्य तक पहुंचने से रोकता है; तीसरा, जब सभी चयनित सबूतों के आधार पर एक बार में सभी उत्तरों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक उत्पादक पाठक का उपयोग किया जाता है, तो क्या एक वैध उत्तर की भविष्यवाणी की जाएगी, यह भी पैथोलॉजिकल रूप से कुछ अन्य वैध उत्तर (ओं) के सबूत पर निर्भर करता है। इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक रिकॉल-फिर-सत्यापित ढांचे के साथ खुले-डोमेन बहु-उत्तरीय प्रश्नों का उत्तर देने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो प्रत्येक उत्तर की तर्क प्रक्रिया को अलग करता है ताकि हम पुनर्प्राप्त साक्ष्य का बेहतर उपयोग कर सकें, जबकि एक ही मेमोरी बाधा के तहत बड़े मॉडल का लाभ उठा सकें। हमारा ढांचा दो बहु-उत्तर डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है, और एक रीरैंक-तब-रीड सिस्टम की तुलना में काफी अधिक सोने के उत्तरों की भविष्यवाणी करता है जो एक ओरेकल रीरैंकर का उपयोग करता है।', 'ja': 'オープンドメインの質問は、オープンエンドで曖昧であり、複数の有効な回答につながる可能性があります。 既存のアプローチは、通常、読者が回答を予測するためにトップランクの証拠を読み取る再ランク・アンド・リード・フレームワークを採用する。 我々の実証的分析によると、このフレームワークは3つの問題に直面している。第1に、記憶の制約の下で大規模な読者を活用するために、再ランカーは、関連性と多様性のバランスが重要ではない一方で、多様な回答をカバーするためにいくつかの関連する経路のみを選択すべきである。第2に、小さな読書予算は、読者が再ランカーによってフィルタリングされた貴重な取得された証拠にアクセスするのを妨げる。第3に、生成的読者を使用してすべての選択された証拠に基づいて一度にすべての回答を予測する場合、有効な回答が病理学的に予測されるかどうかは、いくつかの他の有効な回答の証拠にも依存する。 これらの問題に対処するために、リコール-その後検証のフレームワークでオープンドメインの複数回答の質問に答えることを提案します。これは、各回答の推論プロセスを分離して、取得された証拠をより良く活用すると同時に、同じメモリ制約下で大きなモデルを活用できるようにします。 当社のフレームワークは、2つのマルチ回答データセットで最先端の結果を達成し、オラクルリランカーを使用する再ランクアンテナリーデッドシステムよりも大幅に多くのゴールド回答を予測します。', 'ga': 'Is dócha gur ceisteanna oscailte agus débhríoch a bheidh sna ceisteanna fearainn oscailte, as a dtiocfaidh freagraí bailí iolracha. Is gnách go n-úsáideann cineálacha cur chuige atá ann cheana an creat athrangú-léamh ansin, áit a léann léitheoir fianaise den chéad scoth chun freagraí a thuar. De réir ár n-anailís eimpíreach, tá trí fhadhb ag baint leis an gcreat seo: ar dtús, chun léitheoir mór a ghiaráil faoi shrianta cuimhne, níor cheart don athrangóir ach cúpla sliocht ábhartha a roghnú chun freagraí éagsúla a chlúdach, agus ag an am céanna is neamhfhánach é ábharthacht agus éagsúlacht a chothromú; sa dara háit, cuireann an buiséad léitheoireachta beag cosc ar an léitheoir teacht ar fhianaise luachmhar aisghabhála arna scagadh amach ag an athrangóir; ar an tríú dul síos, nuair a úsáidtear léitheoir giniúna chun freagraí a thuar go hiomlán láithreach bunaithe ar an bhfianaise roghnaithe go léir, braitheann cibé acu an ndéanfar freagra bailí a thuar go paiteolaíoch freisin ar fhianaise ó fhreagra bailí éigin eile nó freagraí bailí eile. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na saincheisteanna seo, tá sé beartaithe againn ceisteanna ilfhreagróirí fearainn oscailte a fhreagairt le creat athghairme ansin-fhíorú, a scarann an próiseas réasúnaíochta ó gach freagra ionas gur féidir linn úsáid níos fearr a bhaint as fianaise aisghafa agus ag an am céanna samhlacha móra a ghiaráil faoi na sonraí. srian cuimhne céanna. Baineann ár gcreat amach torthaí úrscothacha ar dhá thacar sonraí ilfhreagraí, agus déantar i bhfad níos mó freagraí ór a thuar ná córas athrangaithe-ansin a úsáideann athrangóir oracle.', 'ka': 'დიომინის გახსნა კითხვები შესაძლებელია გახსნა და არსებულია, რომლებიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი პასუხების შესაძლებელია. არსებობს მიღება, რომლებიც კითხველი კითხველი უფრო მეტად წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინეთ. ჩვენი ემპერიკალური ანალიზაციის მიხედვით, ეს პრობლემები სამი პრობლემების გამოსახულება: პირველად, რომ მეხსიერების განმავლობაში დიდი კითხველი გამოსახულებლად, მეხსიერების განმავლობა უნდა მონიშნოთ მხოლოდ რამდენიმე მეორე, პატარა კითხვის ბიზეტი უნდა კითხველი წარმოიდგინოთ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოიდგინოთ წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინოთ, რომელიც რერე მესამე, როდესაც გენერაციური კითხველი გამოყენება, ყველაფერი მონიშნული წერტილების განსაზღვრებისთვის, ყველაფერი მონიშნული წერტილების განსაზღვრებისთვის, თუ არა დამატებული პასუხი იქნება ამ პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ მივიღებთ გახსნა დიომინის მრავალ-პასუხი კითხვების შესახებ, რომელიც ყოველ პასუხის პასუხის პროცესის გაყოფილი, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია უფრო მეტი გამოიყენოთ წარმოიცემების გამო ჩვენი პარამეტრები მიიღება მრავალური განახლებების შედეგი შემდეგი განახლებების შემდეგი შემდეგი შემდეგი განახლებების შემდეგ უფრო მეტი ჱლარული განახლებები, რომელიც გამოყენება ორაკულის განა', 'it': "Le domande a dominio aperto sono probabilmente aperte e ambigue, portando a molteplici risposte valide. Gli approcci esistenti in genere adottano il framework ri-rank-then-read, in cui un lettore legge le prove di primo livello per prevedere le risposte. Secondo la nostra analisi empirica, questo framework affronta tre problemi: in primo luogo, per sfruttare un grande lettore sotto un vincolo di memoria, il resenker dovrebbe selezionare solo alcuni passaggi rilevanti per coprire risposte diverse, mentre bilanciare rilevanza e diversità non è banale; in secondo luogo, il piccolo budget di lettura impedisce al lettore di accedere a preziose prove recuperate filtrate dal ricalcolatore; in terzo luogo, quando si utilizza un lettore generativo per prevedere le risposte tutte in una volta sulla base di tutte le prove selezionate, se una risposta valida sarà predetta dipende anche patologicamente dall'evidenza di qualche altra risposta valida. Per affrontare questi problemi, proponiamo di rispondere a domande multi-risposta open-domain con un framework di richiamo e verifica, che separa il processo di ragionamento di ogni risposta in modo da poter utilizzare meglio le prove recuperate sfruttando anche modelli di grandi dimensioni sotto lo stesso vincolo di memoria. Il nostro framework raggiunge risultati all'avanguardia su due set di dati multi-risposta e prevede significativamente più risposte d'oro rispetto a un sistema ri-rank-then-read che utilizza un ri-ranker oracolo.", 'hu': 'A nyílt domain kérdések valószínűleg nyílt végűek és kétértelműek, ami több érvényes választ eredményez. A már meglévő megközelítések általában a rangsorolás után olvasott keretrendszert alkalmazzák, ahol az olvasó a legmagasabb rangú bizonyítékokat olvassa fel a válaszok előrejelzésére. empirikus elemzésünk szerint ez a keretrendszer három problémával néz szembe: először is, hogy egy nagy olvasót emlékezeti korlátozás alá helyezzük, az átrendezőnek csak néhány releváns szakaszt kell kiválasztania a különböző válaszok lefedésére, miközben a relevancia és a sokszínűség kiegyensúlyozása nem triviális; másodszor, a kis olvasási költségvetés megakadályozza, hogy az olvasó hozzáférjen az átkereskedő által kiszűrt értékes, lekeresett bizonyítékokhoz; harmadszor, ha generációs olvasót használ arra, hogy minden kiválasztott bizonyíték alapján egyszerre megjósolja a válaszokat, hogy az érvényes válasz előrejelzése patológiailag más érvényes válasz(ok) bizonyítékaitól is függ. E problémák megoldása érdekében azt javasoljuk, hogy a nyílt domain többválaszos kérdésekre válaszoljunk visszahívás-majd-ellenőrzés keretrendszerrel, amely elválasztja az egyes válaszok érvelési folyamatát, hogy jobban kihasználhassuk a lekért bizonyítékokat, miközben nagyméretű modelleket használjunk ugyanazon memóriakorlátozás alatt. Keretrendszerünk két többválaszú adatkészleten is korszerű eredményeket ér el, és jelentősen több arany választ jósolhat meg, mint egy orákulus újratöltő rendszer.', 'el': 'Οι ερωτήσεις ανοικτού τομέα είναι πιθανό να είναι ανοιχτές και αμφιλεγόμενες, οδηγώντας σε πολλαπλές έγκυρες απαντήσεις. Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις υιοθετούν συνήθως το πλαίσιο επανακατάταξης μετά ανάγνωσης, όπου ένας αναγνώστης διαβάζει κορυφαία στοιχεία για να προβλέψει απαντήσεις. Σύμφωνα με την εμπειρική μας ανάλυση, αυτό το πλαίσιο αντιμετωπίζει τρία προβλήματα: πρώτον, για να αξιοποιήσει έναν μεγάλο αναγνώστη κάτω από έναν περιορισμό μνήμης, ο επανακαταθέτης θα πρέπει να επιλέξει μόνο μερικά σχετικά αποσπάσματα για να καλύψει διαφορετικές απαντήσεις, ενώ η εξισορρόπηση της συνάφειας και της ποικιλομορφίας δεν είναι ασήμαντη. δεύτερον, ο μικρός προϋπολογισμός ανάγνωσης εμποδίζει τον αναγνώστη να έχει πρόσβαση σε πολύτιμα ανακτημένα αποδεικτικά στοιχεία που φιλτράρονται από τον επανακαταθέτη· τρίτον, όταν χρησιμοποιείτε έναν αναγνωστή για να προβλέψετε όλες τις απαντήσεις ταυτόχρονα με βάση όλα τα επιλεγμένα στοιχεία, το αν μια έγκυρη απάντηση θα προβλεφθεί επίσης παθολογικά εξαρτάται από στοιχεία κάποιας άλλης έγκυρης απάντησης. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, προτείνουμε να απαντήσουμε σε ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών απαντήσεων ανοιχτού τομέα με ένα πλαίσιο ανάκλησης και επαλήθευσης, το οποίο διαχωρίζει τη διαδικασία συλλογισμού κάθε απάντησης, έτσι ώστε να μπορούμε να αξιοποιήσουμε καλύτερα τα ανακτηθέντα στοιχεία ενώ παράλληλα αξιοποιούμε μεγάλα μοντέλα υπό τον ίδιο περιορισμό μνήμης. Το πλαίσιο μας επιτυγχάνει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων πολλαπλών απαντήσεων και προβλέπει σημαντικά περισσότερες χρυσές απαντήσεις από ένα σύστημα επανακατάταξης μετά ανάγνωσης που χρησιμοποιεί μια επανακατάταξη μαντείων.', 'mk': 'Прашањата на отворениот домен најверојатно ќе бидат отворени и нејасни, што води до повеќе валидни одговори. Постојаните пристапи обично ја усвоуваат рамката за повторно читање, каде што читателот чита највисоки докази за предвидување на одговорите. According to our empirical analysis, this framework faces three problems: first, to leverage a large reader under a memory constraint, the reranker should select only a few relevant passages to cover diverse answers, while balancing relevance and diversity is non-trivial;  второ, малиот буџет за читање го спречува читателот да има пристап до вредни откриени докази филтрирани од повторното врзување; third, when using a generative reader to predict answers all at once based on all selected evidence, whether a valid answer will be predicted also pathologically depends on evidence of some other valid answer(s).  За решавање на овие прашања, предлагаме одговори на прашања со мултиодговор на отворен домен со рамка за повлекување-потоа-верификација, која го одделува процесот на размислување на секој одговор за да можеме подобро да ги искористиме добиените докази, истовремено користејќи големи модели под истите мемориски ограничувања Нашата рамка постигнува најсовремени резултати на двата мнозинствени податоци, и предвидува значително повеќе златни одговори отколку систем на повторно читање кој користи оракулски повторно реанкер.', 'lt': 'Open-domain questions are likely to be open-ended and ambiguous, leading to multiple valid answers.  Esami metodai paprastai priima pakartotinai perskaitytą sistemą, kurioje skaitytojas skaito aukščiausio lygio įrodymus atsakymams prognozuoti. Remiantis mūsų empirine analize, ši sistema susiduria su trimis problemomis: pirma, norint padidinti didelį skaitytoją atminties apribojimu, pakartotinis skaitytojas turėtų pasirinkti tik keletą svarbių dalykų, kad apimtų įvairius atsakymus, o svarbos ir įvairovės pusiausvyra yra nedidelė; antra, nedidelis skaitymo biudžetas neleidžia skaitytojui susipažinti su vertingais surinktais įrodymais, kuriuos filtruoja pakartotinis ankeris; third, when using a generative reader to predict answers all at once based on all selected evidence, whether a valid answer will be predicted also pathologically depends on evidence of some other valid answer(s).  Siekiant išspręsti šiuos klausimus, siūlome atsakyti į atviros srities klausimus su daugeliu atsakymų, taikant atšaukimo ir tada tikrinimo sistemą, kuri atskirtų kiekvieno atsakymo pagrindimo procesą, kad galėtume geriau panaudoti surinktus įrodymus ir kartu naudoti didelius modelius taikant tą patį atminties apribojimą. Mūsų sistema sukuria naujausius rezultatus dviejuose daugelio atsakymų duomenų rinkiniuose ir numato gerokai daugiau auksinių atsakymų nei pakartotinai skaitoma sistema, kuria naudojamas orakulinis pakartotinis ankeris.', 'ms': 'Soalan domain terbuka mungkin akan terbuka-akhir dan ambiguh, membawa kepada jawapan yang sah berbilang. pendekatan yang wujud biasanya mengadopsi kerangka rebank-then-read, di mana pembaca membaca bukti tertinggi untuk meramalkan jawapan. Menurut analisis empirik kami, kerangka ini menghadapi tiga masalah: pertama, untuk mengambil alih pembaca besar dibawah batasan memori, pembaca semula patut pilih hanya beberapa laluan yang berkaitan untuk menutupi jawapan berbeza, sementara mengembangkan relevan dan kebanyakan adalah tidak trivial; kedua, anggaran pembacaan kecil menghalang pembaca daripada mengakses bukti yang berharga yang dikeluarkan yang ditapis oleh pembaca semula; ketiga, apabila menggunakan pembaca generatif untuk meramalkan jawapan secara sekaligus berdasarkan semua bukti yang dipilih, sama ada jawapan yang sah juga akan dijangka secara patologi bergantung pada bukti beberapa jawapan yang sah yang lain. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami cadangkan untuk menjawab soalan-jawapan-domain terbuka dengan kerangka pemulihan-kemudian-sahkan, yang memisahkan proses alasan bagi setiap jawapan supaya kita boleh gunakan bukti yang diterima dengan lebih baik sambil menggunakan model besar di bawah batasan memori yang sama. kerangka kami mencapai keputusan terbaik pada dua set data berbilang jawapan, dan meramalkan lebih banyak jawapan emas daripada sistem rebank-then-read yang menggunakan rebanker oracle.', 'ml': '@ info: status നിലവിലുള്ള സമീപത്തുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ വായിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ ഒരു വായിക്കാരന്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d റാങ്കിങ According to our empirical analysis, this framework faces three problems: first, to leverage a large reader under a memory constraint, the reranker should select only a few relevant passages to cover diverse answers, while balancing relevance and diversity is non-trivial;  രണ്ടാമത്തേത്, വായിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ചെറിയ വായിക്കുന്ന ബുജെറ്റ് വീണ്ടെടുത്ത തെളിവുകള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുത്ത ത തെ മൂന്നാമത്, ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നവന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d എല്ലാ തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ത തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ത തെളിവുകള്\u200dക്കും അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ഉത്തരം പ്രവചിക ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു ഓർമ്മ- പിന്നെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് കൊണ്ട് തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d പല-ഉത് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമേക്ക് രണ്ട് പല-ഉത്തരമുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d സ്ഥിതിയുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നേടുന്നു. ഒരു ഓറച്ചല്\u200d വീണ്ടും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുനരു', 'mn': 'Харин нээлттэй холбоотой асуултууд нээлттэй болон дуусгагүй байж магадгүй, олон зөв хариултыг хүргэж чадна. Ингээд байгаа арга барилга нь хариултыг тодорхойлдохын тулд уншсан дахин дахин уншсан хэлбэрийг ашигладаг. Бидний эзэнт шалгалтын тулд энэ хэлбэрт гурван асуудалтай харагдаж байна: эхлээд, санамжийн хязгаар доор том уншигчийг ашиглан, дахин хэлбэрээр олон хариулт гаргахад зөвхөн хэдэн хамааралтай зам сонгох хэрэгтэй. Харин тэнцвэртэй болон олон янзаар Хоёрдугаарт, жижиг унших төсөл нь уншигчид үнэ цэнэтэй хүлээн авах баримтуудыг дахин шинжилдэг байдаг. Гурав дахь, бүх сонголт баримт хариултыг тодорхойлдохын тулд генератив уншигч ашиглах үед, зөв хариулт нь мөн эмгэгтэй хариулт нь бусад зөв хариултын баталгаас хамаарна. Эдгээр асуудлуудыг бодохын тулд бид нээлттэй холбоотой олон хариултын асуултуудыг санах, дараа нь шалгах, хариултын шалтгаан үйл явцыг хуваалцах боломжтой. Тиймээс бид илүү олон баталгаа ашиглах боломжтой. Мөн том загварыг ижил санамжийн хязгаар до Бидний үйл ажиллагааны хувьд урлагийн үр дүнг хоёр олон хариултын өгөгдлийн сан дээр гарч ирнэ. Тэгээд үгүйсгэн дахин унших системээс илүү алт хариултыг таамагладаг.', 'mt': 'Mistoqsijiet b’dominju miftuħ x’aktarx li jkunu miftuħa u ambigwi, li jwasslu għal diversi tweġibiet validi. L-approċċi eżistenti tipikament jadottaw il-qafas li jerġa’ jinqara mill-ġdid, fejn qarrej jaqra l-evidenza ta’ l-ogħla livell biex jipprevedi t-tweġibiet. Skont l-analiżi empirika tagħna, dan il-qafas jiffaċċja tliet problemi: l-ewwel, biex jinġieb ingranaġġ minn qarrej kbir taħt restrizzjoni tal-memorja, il-qarrej mill-ġdid għandu jagħżel biss ftit passi rilevanti biex ikopri risposti varji, filwaqt li l-ibbilanċjar tar-rilevanza u d-diversità mhuwiex trivjali; it-tieni, il-baġit għall-qari żgħir jimpedixxi lill-qarrej milli jaċċessa evidenza ta’ valur miksuba ffiltrata mill-qarrej mill-ġdid; it-tielet, meta jintuża qarrej ġenerattiv biex jipprevedi t-tweġibiet kollha f’daqqa bbażati fuq l-evidenza magħżula kollha, jekk tweġiba valida tkunx imbassra wkoll b’mod patoloġiku tiddependi fuq evidenza ta’ xi tweġiba(jiet) valida(i) oħra. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, qed nipproponu li nwieġbu mistoqsijiet b’ħafna tweġibiet f’dominju miftuħ b’qafas ta’ rifjut-imbagħad-verifika, li jissepara l-proċess ta’ raġunament ta’ kull tweġiba sabiex nistgħu nużaw a ħjar l-evidenza miksuba filwaqt li ninfurzaw ukoll mudelli kbar taħt l-istess restrizzjoni tal-memorja. Il-qafas tagħna jikseb riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta b’ħafna tweġibiet, u jipprevedi b’mod sinifikanti aktar tweġibiet tad-deheb minn sistema li terġa’ tinqara mill-ġdid u li tuża sistema li terġa’ tinqara mill-ġdid.', 'pl': 'Pytania otwarte w domenie prawdopodobnie będą otwarte i niejednoznaczne, co prowadzi do wielu poprawnych odpowiedzi. Istniejące podejścia zazwyczaj przyjmują ramy "renank-then-read", gdzie czytelnik czyta najwyższej rangi dowody, aby przewidzieć odpowiedzi. Według naszej analizy empirycznej, ramy te stoją w obliczu trzech problemów: po pierwsze, aby wykorzystać dużego czytelnika pod ograniczeniem pamięci, ponowny ranker powinien wybrać tylko kilka istotnych fragmentów, aby pokryć różnorodne odpowiedzi, przy czym równoważenie znaczenia i różnorodności jest nietrywialne; po drugie, niewielki budżet odczytu uniemożliwia czytelnikowi dostęp do cennych pozyskanych dowodów wyfiltrowanych przez ponownego rankera; Po trzecie, przy użyciu czytnika generacyjnego do przewidywania wszystkich odpowiedzi naraz na podstawie wszystkich wybranych dowodów, czy prawidłowa odpowiedź zostanie przewidziana również patologicznie zależy od dowodów innych prawidłowych odpowiedzi. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy odpowiedź na otwarte pytania wieloodpowiedzi za pomocą frameworku recall-then-verify, który oddziela proces rozumowania każdej odpowiedzi, tak abyśmy mogli lepiej wykorzystać pozyskane dowody, jednocześnie wykorzystując duże modele w ramach tego samego ograniczenia pamięci. Nasz framework osiąga najnowocześniejsze wyniki na dwóch zbiorach danych wielu odpowiedzi i przewiduje znacznie więcej złotych odpowiedzi niż system ponownego rankowania, a następnie odczytu, który wykorzystuje ponownie ranker wyroczni.', 'no': 'Opna domenespørsmål er sannsynlegvis open-ended og ambiguous, som fører til fleire gyldige svar. Det eksisterande tilnærminga kan vanlegvis bruka rammeverket for å gjenoppretta og lesa, der ei lesar lesar øvre rangeringsbeviser for å foregå svarar. Først, for å levera ein stor lesar under ein minne-grense, bør det berre velja noen relevante passar for å dekka ulike svar, mens balansering av relevante og mangfoldighet er ikkje trivial. andre, den lite lesebbudsjeten hindrar lesaren å få tilgang til verdilege henta beviser som filtrert ut av gjenopprettararen. Tredje, ved å bruka ein generelt lesar for å forhåndsvisa svar alle samtidig basert på alle valde beviser, om ein gyldig svar vert forhåndsvisa også patologisk avhengig av beviser på nokre andre gyldige svar( ar). For å handtera desse problemene, fører vi å svara på open-domain fleire svarspunktar med eit rekoll-then-verify rammeverket, som skiljer grunnleggingsprosessen av kvar svar slik at vi kan gjera betre bruk av henta beviser medan vi også leverer store modeller under samme minne-grense. Rammeverket vårt oppnår tilstanden av kunsten på to fleire svardatasett, og forventar mykje meir gull svar enn eit reinank-og-lesingssystemet som brukar ein orakul gjenoppretter.', 'ro': 'Întrebările pe domeniu deschis sunt probabil deschise și ambigue, ducând la răspunsuri multiple valide. Abordările existente adoptă, de obicei, cadrul re-rank-apoi-citit, în cazul în care un cititor citește dovezi de rang superior pentru a prezice răspunsuri. Conform analizei noastre empirice, acest cadru se confruntă cu trei probleme: în primul rând, pentru a mobiliza un cititor mare sub o constrângere de memorie, recankerul ar trebui să selecteze doar câteva pasaje relevante pentru a acoperi răspunsuri diverse, în timp ce echilibrarea relevanței și diversității este non-trivială; în al doilea rând, bugetul redus de lectură împiedică cititorul să acceseze dovezi valoroase recuperate filtrate de către retanker; în al treilea rând, atunci când se utilizează un cititor generativ pentru a prezice răspunsurile simultan pe baza tuturor dovezilor selectate, dacă un răspuns valid va fi prezis depinde, de asemenea, din punct de vedere patologic, de dovezile unui alt răspuns valid. Pentru a rezolva aceste probleme, propunem să răspundem la întrebări cu mai multe răspunsuri pe domeniu deschis cu un cadru de rechemare-apoi-verificare, care separă procesul de raționament al fiecărui răspuns, astfel încât să putem utiliza mai bine dovezile recuperate, utilizând în același timp modele mari sub aceeași constrângere de memorie. Cadrul nostru obține rezultate de ultimă oră pe două seturi de date cu mai multe răspunsuri și previne semnificativ mai multe răspunsuri de aur decât un sistem de reîncărcare-apoi-citire care utilizează un reîncărcare oracol.', 'kk': 'Open- domain сұрақтары бірнеше дұрыс жауап беру үшін ашылған және бұндай болуы мүмкін. Бар жағдайда жауаптарды алдын- ала қайта оқылған қоршауын қолданып, оқушы жауаптарды алдын- ала оқу үшін жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы дәлелдерді оқуға болады. Эмпирикалық анализ сәйкестігімізге сәйкес, бұл қоршауы үш мәселелерде тұрады: біріншіден, жадын шектеу арқылы үлкен оқушыларды жадын шектеу үшін, қайта оқушылар әртүрлі жауаптарды таңдау үшін тек бірнеше екіншіден, кішкентай оқу бөлшегі оқу құқығына қайта оқу құқықтарының сүзгісін қайта сүзгілеуге болмайды; қайта оқу бөлшегі үшінші, барлық таңдалған мәліметтерге негізделген жауаптарды бақылау үшін генеративті оқушы қолданғанда, дұрыс жауапты патологикалық түрде басқа дұрыс жауап( лар) ға тәуелді. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, біз ашылған доменге көп жауап сұрақтарын бірнеше жауап беру сұрақтарына жауап береміз. Бұл әрбір жауаптың бақылау процесін бөліктеп, біз бір жадын шектеп үлкен үлкен моделдерді қолдануға болад Біздің қоршауымыз екі көп жауап беретін деректер қорларының күйінің нәтижесін жеткізеді, және оқу жүйесінен қайта оқу жүйесінен артық алтын жауаптарын көрсетеді.', 'so': "Shaqooyin furan waxaa suurtagal ah in ay noqdaan furan islamarkaasna ay sababtaa jawaabo badan oo shaqeyn. Existing approaches typically adopt the rerank-then-read framework, where a reader reads top-ranking evidence to predict answers.  Sida uu ku qoran baaritaankeenna qiimeynta, qashinkaasu wuxuu u jeedaa sadex dhibaato ah: marka hore, in uu qofka akhriyaa oo weyn u soo diro qasabka xusuusta, qofka dambeeya waa in uu doortaa baasabooyin yar oo la xiriira si ay u daboolaan jawaabo kala duduwan, marka qiyaasta xiriirka iyo kala duduwanu ma aha mid aan suurtagal ahayn; Second, bajejetarka yar ee akhriska ayaa ka hor joogsaday in qofka akhriyey uu helo caddeynta qiimaha la soo celiyey oo lagu filay qofka ka dib. saddexaad, marka uu isticmaalo karraaniga geneeral ah si uu wax ugu jawaabo isla markaasna uu ku saleynayo calaamadaha la doortay oo dhan, in jawaabta shaqeynta lagu sii xaqiijiyo iyo in uu si caafimaad ah ugu xiran yahay markhaatiyada jawaabaha kale oo shaqeynaya. Si aan uga sheekeyno arrimahan, waxaan ka fekeraynaa in aan jawaabo su'aalo furan oo furan ah ka jawaabno firaaqada xusuusta-kadib-xaqiiqsan, kaasoo kala soocaa koorasyada sababta ah oo jawaab walba si aan ugu fiican u isticmaalno caddeynta la soo celiyey, isla markaasna aan sameynno modelal waaweyn oo ku qoraya qasabka xusuusta. Shaqoolkayagu wuxuu helaa arimaha farshaxanka labada sawir oo jawaabta badan, wuxuuna horay u sheegayaa jawaabo dahab ah oo ka badan nidaamka dib-u-akhriyey oo isticmaalaya dib-u-celinta hore.", 'si': 'Open- domain ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විවෘත වෙන්න පුළුවන් අවසන් වෙන්න පුළුවන්, වඩා වැදගත් ප්\u200dරතිච්චි සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරන්න පුළුවන්, කියවන්නේ කියවන්නේ පුළුවන් ප අපේ ඉම්පිරිකාලික විශ්ලේෂණය අනුවෙන්, මේ පරීක්ෂණය තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා: මුලින්, මතකය සීමාවෙන් ලොකු කියවන්න ලොකු කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩුව දෙවෙනියි, පුංචි කියවන්න බුද්ධියක් කියවන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ සාක්ෂියක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළු තුන්වෙනි වෙලාවයි, ප්\u200dරතිචාර කියවන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් භාවිත කරලා හැම ප්\u200dරතිචාර සාක්ෂියක්ම පරීක්ෂණය කරලා ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200d මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ඒක හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පුළුවන් විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙකක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක විශාල ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම පුළුවන් විශ', 'sr': 'Pitanja otvorenih domena su verovatno otvorenih i ambigutnih, što vodi do višestrukih validnih odgovora. Postojeći pristupi obično usvojavaju okvir prečitanja, a čitač čita najvišeg reda dokaze za predviđanje odgovora. Prema našoj empiričkoj analizi, ovaj okvir se suočava sa tri problema: prvo, da bi utjecao na veliki čitač pod ograničenjem pamćenja, prevoditelj treba odabrati samo nekoliko relevantnih prolaza za pokrivanje različitih odgovora, dok je balanciranje relevantnosti i raznolikosti nezavisno; Drugo, mali proračun za čitanje sprječava čitaču da pristupi vrijednim prikupljenim dokazima filtriranim od strane ponovnog proračunara; Treće, kada koristi generativni čitač za predviđanje odgovora svi odjednom na temelju svih odabranih dokaza, da li će biti predviđen i platni odgovor patološki zavisi od dokaza nekih drugih validnih odgovora. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predlažemo odgovoriti na pitanja otvorenog domena sa višeodgovornim okvirom podsjećanja i potom potvrđenog okvira, koji razdvaja razumni proces svakog odgovora tako da možemo bolje iskoristiti prikupljene dokaze, a takođe uvećati velike modele pod istom ograničenjem pamćenja. Naš okvir postiže rezultate umetnosti na dve višeodgovorne podatke, i predviđa značajno više zlatnih odgovora od rehabilitacije i pročitanja sustava koji koristi rehabilitaciju orala.', 'sv': 'Öppna domänfrågor är sannolikt öppna och tvetydiga, vilket leder till flera giltiga svar. Befintliga tillvägagångssätt använder sig vanligtvis av ramverket för omräkning sedan läsning, där en läsare läser högst rankade bevis för att förutsäga svar. Enligt vår empiriska analys står detta ramverk inför tre problem: för det första, för att dra nytta av en stor läsare under en minnesbegränsning, bör återförankaren endast välja ett fåtal relevanta avsnitt för att täcka olika svar, medan balansen mellan relevans och mångfald är icke-trivial. För det andra hindrar den lilla läsbudgeten läsaren från att få tillgång till värdefulla inhämtade bevis som filtrerats ut av återförankaren. För det tredje, när man använder en generativ läsare för att förutsäga svar på en gång baserat på alla utvalda bevis, beror huruvida ett giltigt svar kommer att förutses också patologiskt på bevis för några andra giltiga svar. För att ta itu med dessa frågor föreslår vi att besvara flersvarsfrågor med öppen domän med ett ramverk för återkallande och verifiering, som skiljer resonemanget för varje svar så att vi bättre kan använda inhämtade bevis samtidigt som vi utnyttjar stora modeller under samma minnesbegränsning. Vårt ramverk uppnår toppmoderna resultat på två dataset med flera svar, och förutspår betydligt fler guldsvar än ett system med omläsning och läsning som använder en orakel omläsning.', 'ta': 'திறந்த களம் கேள்விகள் திறந்த திறந்த மற்றும் வெறுமையாக இருக்கலாம், இது பல செல்லுபடியான பதில்களை கொண்டுள்ளது. Existing approaches typically adopt the rerank-then-read framework, where a reader reads top-ranking evidence to predict answers.  எங்கள் விருப்பப் பெரிய விளக்கத்தை போன்று, இந்த சட்டத்தின் மூன்று பிரச்சனைகள் முகம் நேர்ந்துள்ளது: முதலில், நினைவு கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒரு பெரிய படிப்பாளரை வழங இரண்டாவது, சிறிய படிப்பு budget படிப்பாளரை வாசிப்பவர் மதிப்புள்ள தெரியும் தெரியும் ஆதாரங்களை அணுகாமல் தடுக்கிறது. மூன்றாவது, ஒரு பொது படிப்பானை பயன்படுத்தி அனைத்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட ஆதாரங்களையும் அடிப்படையில் அனைத்து விடைகளையும் முற்படுத்தும் போத இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை விட்டுக் கொள்வதற்கு, நாம் திறந்த களம் பல- விடை கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்க பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது ஒவ்வொரு விடையின் காரணப்படுத்தல் செயலை பிரித் நமது சட்டத்தில் இரண்டு பல பதில் தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் மாநிலை முடிவுகளை பெறுகிறது, மற்றும் முக்கியமான தங்க விடைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் ஒரு ஒற்றை மீண்டும் பட', 'ur': 'کھولنے والی ڈومین سؤال شاید کھولنے والی اور غلطی ہونے والی ہے، بہت سی معتبر جواب کی وجہ سے۔ موجود ہونے والی تقریبا معمولاً دوبارہ پڑھنے والی فراموش کو قبول کرتا ہے جہاں ایک پڑھنے والا پائیں رقم کی مدرک پڑھتا ہے۔ ہمارے امپری تحلیل کے مطابق، یہ فرم تین مشکلات کے سامنے موجود ہوتے ہیں: پہلے، ایک بڑے پڑھنے والے کو یاد بندی کے نیچے دفع کرنے کے لئے، دوبارہ پیدا کرنے والے کو صرف چند موجود مسائل کا انتخاب کرنا چاہیے کہ مختلف جواب کو پورا کرنے کے لئے، حالانکہ موجود اور مختلف تعلقات کا تعلق برا دوسرا، چھوٹی پڑھنے والی بوڈیٹ کو پڑھنے والوں کو روک دیتا ہے کہ ان کے ذریعہ مقدار حاصل ہونے والی دلیلوں کو دوبارہ پھیر لیا جاتا ہے تیسری، جب ایک پیدائٹیوں کے پڑھنے والے کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ تمام منتخب شوہروں پر ایک دفعہ جواب دکھائے جاتے ہیں، کیا ایک معتبر جواب بھی پٹولوژیکی طور پر بھی مضبوط ہے اور کسی اور معتبر جواب کے شہادت پر بھی مضبوط ہے. ہم ان مسائلوں کے بارے میں جواب دینے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ کھولے ہوئے دامین چند-جواب سوالوں کی جواب دیں، جو ہر جواب کے منطقی پروسس کو جدا کر دیتے ہیں تاکہ ہم اپنا استعمال کریں اور ایک ہی یاد بندی کے اندر بڑے موڈل کو بھی اپنا استعمال کریں۔ ہمارا فرمود دو متعدد جواب دیٹ سٹ پر موجود ہے اور ایک دوبارہ پڑھنے کی سیستم سے زیادہ سونے کی جواب پہنچاتا ہے جو ایک اوراکل دوبارہ پڑھنے والا استعمال کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Mavjud murakkablar odatda keyin oʻqib boʻladigan freymni ishlatish mumkin. Bu yerda oʻquvchi javoblarni predict qilish uchun yuqori chegara hujjatni oʻqish mumkin. Bizning muvaffaqiyatlarimiz davomida, bu freym uch muammolar bilan uchta muammolar yuboradi: avval, xotira qanday o'quvchiga katta oʻquvchini yozish uchun keyingi keyingi qisqaruv javoblarni koʻchirish uchun bir necha muhim maxfiy soʻzlarni tanlashi kerak, va har xil muammolarni va tenglarni o'zg Ikkinchi soniya, kichkina o'qish bajeti o'qituvchi qiymati olingan hujjatni olishdan olib tashlab qoladi; keyin keyingi kelib chiqindilar quyidagi qiymatni olib tashlashdan oldin; 3, birinchi marta hamma tanlangan hujjatda javob berish uchun generativ oʻquvchidan foydalanilganda, hamma narsa tanlangan javob berilganda, xato javob koʻrilganda va boshqa javob( lar) haqiqiqiy hujjatga bogʻliq. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun biz ochiq domen savollariga bir nechta javob beramiz, qaytadan keyin tasdiqlash qoidagi javob javob beradi. Bu bir javob javob jarayonini ajratish uchun biz bir xotira qanday katta modellarni boshqarishimiz mumkin. Our framework achieves state-of-the-art results on two multi-answer datasets, and predicts significantly more gold answers than a rerank-then-read system that uses an oracle reranker.", 'vi': 'Những câu hỏi mở miền có thể bị ngắt và mơ hồ, dẫn đến nhiều câu trả lời hợp lệ. Thông thường các phương pháp tồn tại được thiết lập lại, nơi mà người đọc đọc đọc đọc các bằng chứng cao nhất để dự đoán câu trả lời. Theo kinh nghiệm của chúng tôi, cơ sở này đối mặt với ba vấn đề: thứ nhất, để thúc đẩy một người đọc lớn dưới sự kiểm soát trí nhớ, người trả lời sẽ chỉ chọn ra vài đoạn liên quan để bao gồm các câu trả lời khác nhau, trong khi sự quan trọng và đa dạng là không tầm thường; Thứ hai, ngân sách đọc nhỏ ngăn không cho độc giả truy cập các bằng chứng có giá trị được lọc ra từ cỗ máy. Thứ ba, khi s ử dụng một máy đọc sinh sản để dự đoán câu trả lời tất cả cùng một lúc dựa trên tất cả bằng chứng đã chọn, liệu câu trả lời hợp lệ có được dự đoán cũng dựa vào chứng cứ của một số câu trả lời hợp lệ khác. Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị trả lời câu hỏi đa câu trả lời rộng mở bằng một cơ sở hồi phục-sau-kiểm tra, nó phân tách quá trình lập luận của mỗi câu trả lời để chúng ta có thể sử dụng bằng chứng phục hồi tốt hơn, và cũng dùng các mô hình lớn dưới cùng một giới hạn trí nhớ. Cơ chế của chúng tôi đạt được kết quả hiện đại trên hai bộ dữ liệu đa trả lời, và dự đoán được nhiều câu trả lời vàng hơn nhiều so với một hệ thống đọc lại, sử dụng một chuỗi nhà tiên tri.', 'bg': 'Въпросите с отворен домейн вероятно ще бъдат неопределени и двусмислени, което води до множество валидни отговори. Съществуващите подходи обикновено приемат рамката за пренареждане и след това четене, където читателят чете най-висшите доказателства, за да прогнозира отговорите. Според нашия емпиричен анализ тази рамка е изправена пред три проблема: първо, за да се възползва от голям читател при ограничение на паметта, преанкерът трябва да избере само няколко релевантни пасажа, за да обхване различни отговори, докато балансирането на релевантност и разнообразие е нетривиално; второ, малкият бюджет за четене предотвратява достъпа на читателя до ценни извлечени доказателства, филтрирани от преанкера; трето, когато се използва генеративен четец за прогнозиране на отговори наведнъж въз основа на всички избрани доказателства, дали валиден отговор ще бъде прогнозиран също патологично зависи от доказателствата за някой друг валиден отговор (и). За да се справим с тези въпроси, предлагаме да отговорим на въпроси с множество отговори с отворен домейн рамка за връщане след проверка, която разделя процеса на разсъждаване на всеки отговор, така че да можем да използваме по-добре получените доказателства, като същевременно използваме големи модели при същото ограничение на паметта. Нашата рамка постига най-съвременни резултати на два набора от данни с множество отговори и прогнозира значително повече златни отговори, отколкото система за повторно банкиране след четене, която използва повторно банкиране на оракул.', 'nl': 'Open-domein vragen zijn waarschijnlijk open-end en dubbelzinnig, wat leidt tot meerdere geldige antwoorden. Bestaande benaderingen gebruiken meestal het rerank-then-read framework, waarbij een lezer hoogstaand bewijsmateriaal leest om antwoorden te voorspellen. Volgens onze empirische analyse wordt dit raamwerk geconfronteerd met drie problemen: ten eerste, om een grote lezer te gebruiken onder een geheugenbeperking, moet de rebanker slechts enkele relevante passages selecteren om diverse antwoorden te behandelen, terwijl het evenwicht tussen relevantie en diversiteit niet triviaal is; Ten tweede voorkomt het kleine leesbudget dat de lezer toegang heeft tot waardevol opgehaald bewijsmateriaal dat door de rebanker wordt gefilterd; Ten derde, wanneer een generatieve lezer gebruikt om antwoorden in één keer te voorspellen op basis van al het geselecteerde bewijs, hangt de vraag of een geldig antwoord zal worden voorspeld pathologisch ook af van bewijs van andere geldige antwoorden. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, stellen we voor om open-domein multi-antwoord vragen te beantwoorden met een recall-then-verify framework, dat het redeneringsproces van elk antwoord scheidt, zodat we beter gebruik kunnen maken van opgehaald bewijsmateriaal terwijl we ook gebruik kunnen maken van grote modellen onder dezelfde geheugenbeperking. Ons framework bereikt state-of-the-art resultaten op twee datasets met meerdere antwoorden en voorspelt aanzienlijk meer gouden antwoorden dan een systeem met opnieuw rangschikken en lezen dat een oracle reranker gebruikt.', 'hr': 'Pitanja otvorenih domena vjerojatno će biti otvorena i ambigučna, što će dovesti do višestruke vrijedne odgovore. Postojeći pristupi obično usvojavaju okvir prečitanja potom čitanja, gdje čitač čita najvišeg reda dokaze za predviđanje odgovora. Prema našoj empiričkoj analizi, ovaj okvir se suočava s tri problema: prvo, kako bi utjecao na veliki čitač pod ograničenjem pamćenja, prevoditelj treba odabrati samo nekoliko relevantnih prolaza za pokrivanje različitih odgovora, a balanciranje relevantnosti i raznolikosti nije trivialno; Drugo, mali proračun za čitanje sprječava čitaču pristup vrijednom prikupljenom dokazima filtriranim od strane preokretača; Treće, kada koristi generativni čitač za predviđanje odgovora na jednom temelju svih odabranih dokaza, da li će se predviđati validan odgovor također patološki zavisi od dokaza nekih drugih validnih odgovora. Za rješavanje tih pitanja, predlažemo odgovoriti na otvorena domena multiodgovorna pitanja s okvirom podsjećanja i potom potvrđenja, koji razdvaja razumljivog procesa svakog odgovora tako da možemo bolje iskoristiti prikupljene dokaze, a također utjecati na velike modele pod istom ograničenjem sjećanja. Naš okvir postiže rezultate umjetnosti na dvije višeodgovorne podatke, i predviđa značajno više zlatnih odgovora od sustava prepročitanja potom čitanja koji koristi preuređaj orala.', 'da': 'Spørgsmål med åbent domæne vil sandsynligvis være åbne og tvetydige, hvilket fører til flere gyldige svar. Eksisterende fremgangsmåder anvender typisk rammerne for re-rank-then-read, hvor en læser top-ranking evidens for at forudsige svar. Ifølge vores empiriske analyse står denne ramme over for tre problemer: For det første, for at udnytte en stor læser under en hukommelsesbegrænsning, bør genrankeren kun vælge nogle få relevante passager til at dække forskellige svar, mens balancering af relevans og mangfoldighed ikke er triviel; For det andet forhindrer det lille læsebudgift læseren i at få adgang til værdifulde indhentede beviser, der er filtreret ud af omsankeren. For det tredje, når der bruges en generativ læser til at forudsige svar på én gang baseret på alle udvalgte beviser, afhænger om et gyldigt svar vil blive forudsagt også patologisk af beviser for nogle andre gyldige svar. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi at besvare spørgsmål med flere svar på åbent domæne med en ramme tilbagekaldelse og bekræftelse, der adskiller ræsonnementsprocessen for hvert svar, så vi bedre kan udnytte hentede beviser, samtidig med at vi udnytter store modeller under samme hukommelsesbegrænsning. Vores ramme opnår state-of-the-art resultater på to datasæt med flere svar, og forudsiger betydeligt flere guldsvar end et re-ank-then-read system, der bruger en orakel re-anker.', 'de': 'Open-Domain-Fragen sind wahrscheinlich offen und mehrdeutig, was zu mehreren validen Antworten führt. Bestehende Ansätze verwenden typischerweise das Reank-then-read-Framework, bei dem ein Leser hochrangige Beweise liest, um Antworten vorherzusagen. Nach unserer empirischen Analyse steht dieses Framework vor drei Problemen: Erstens sollte der Reranker, um einen großen Leser unter einer Gedächtnisbeschränkung zu nutzen, nur wenige relevante Passagen auswählen, um verschiedene Antworten abzudecken, während das Gleichgewicht zwischen Relevanz und Diversität nicht trivial ist; Zweitens verhindert das geringe Lesebudget, dass der Leser auf wertvolle abgerufene Beweise zugreifen kann, die vom Reranker herausgefiltert werden; Drittens, wenn ein generatives Lesegerät verwendet wird, um Antworten auf einmal basierend auf allen ausgewählten Beweisen vorherzusagen, hängt die Frage, ob eine gültige Antwort vorhergesagt wird, auch pathologisch von Beweisen für andere gültige Antworten ab. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, schlagen wir vor, offene Fragen mit mehreren Antworten mit einem Recall-then-Verify Framework zu beantworten, das den Argumentationsprozess jeder Antwort trennt, so dass wir gewonnene Beweise besser nutzen können und gleichzeitig große Modelle unter derselben Speicherbeschränkung nutzen können. Unser Framework erzielt State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse auf zwei Multi-Antwortdatensätzen und prognostiziert deutlich mehr Goldantworten als ein Rerank-then-Read-System, das einen Orakel-Reranker verwendet.', 'id': 'Pertanyaan domain terbuka mungkin akan terbuka-akhir dan ambigu, mengarah ke beberapa jawaban yang valid. Pendekatan yang ada biasanya mengadopsi rangka rerank-then-read, di mana pembaca membaca bukti tertinggi untuk memprediksi jawaban. Menurut analisis empirik kita, kerangka ini menghadapi tiga masalah: pertama, untuk menggunakan pembaca besar di bawah batas ingatan, pembaca ulang harus memilih hanya beberapa kalimat relevan untuk menutupi jawaban berbeda, sementara memperbalansikan relevan dan kebanyakan adalah tidak trivial; second, the small reading budget prevents the reader from accessing valuable retrieved evidence filtered out by the reranker;  ketiga, ketika menggunakan pembaca generasi untuk memprediksi jawaban semua sekaligus berdasarkan semua bukti yang dipilih, apakah jawaban yang sah akan diprediksi juga secara patologis tergantung pada bukti dari beberapa jawaban yang sah lainnya. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami mengusulkan untuk menjawab pertanyaan-multi-jawaban domain terbuka dengan rangka recall-then-verify, yang memisahkan proses reasoning dari setiap jawaban sehingga kita dapat membuat lebih baik penggunaan bukti yang diterima sambil juga menggunakan model besar di bawah batas ingatan yang sama. kerangka kami mencapai hasil terbaik pada dua set data multi-jawaban, dan memprediksi jauh lebih banyak jawaban emas daripada sistem rerank-then-read yang menggunakan reranker oracle.', 'sw': 'Open-domain questions are likely to be open-ended and ambiguous, leading to multiple valid answers.  Matokeo yanayopo kwa kawaida huchukua mfumo wa kusoma tena, ambapo wasomaji anasoma ushahidi wa ngazi za juu ili kutabiri majibu. Kwa mujibu wa uchambuzi wetu wa kipekee, mfumo huu unakabiliwa na matatizo matatu: kwanza, kwa kutumia msomaji mkubwa chini ya vizuizi vya kumbukumbu, mpya huyo anapaswa kuchagua njia chache tu zinazohusiana na kupambana na majibu mbalimbali, wakati kulingana na umuhimu na utofauti hauna vizuri; pili, bajeti ndogo ya kusoma inazuia wasomaji kutokupatia ushahidi wa thamani uliopatikana na kuchujwa tena; tatu, pale akitumia msomaji mkuu kutabiri jibu zote kwa wakati mmoja kwa kutumia ushahidi wote waliochaguliwa, kama jibu sahihi litatabiriwa pia kimsingi unategemea ushahidi wa baadhi ya majibu(answer(s). Ili kuzungumzia masuala haya, tunapendekeza kujibu maswali mengi ya wazi ya ndani kwa mfumo wa kutambuliwa tena, ambao unatenganisha mchakato wa kisheria wa kila jibu ili tufanye vizuri kutumia ushahidi uliopatikana wakati pia kutumia mifano makubwa chini ya vizuizi hivyo. Miundombi yetu inafanikiwa matokeo ya sanaa kwenye seti mbili za majibu, na inatabiri majibu mengi zaidi ya dhahabu kuliko mfumo wa kusoma tena tena na unaotumia mpya wa simu.', 'fa': 'پرسش\u200cهای دامنی باز احتمالاً پایان باز و غیرقابل باز می\u200cشوند، که به پاسخهای بسیار قابل ارائه می\u200cدهند. نزدیک\u200cهای موجود معمولاً چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارپایین را می\u200c بر اساس تحلیل امپراتیک ما، این چهارچوب سه مشکل را روبرو می\u200cکند: اول، برای تأثیر یک خواننده بزرگ زیر یک محدود حافظه، دوباره باید فقط چند مسیر مربوط به پوشش جواب مختلف را انتخاب کند، در حالی که تعادل مربوط به تعادل و مختلفیت غیر قابل توجه است. دوم، بودجه خواندن کوچک از خواندن متوقف کردن خواندگان از دسترسی مدارک ارزشمندی که توسط دوباره خواندن فیلتر داده شده است. سوم، وقتی استفاده از یک خواننده generative برای پیش بینی از پاسخ\u200cها بر روی تمام مدرک\u200cهای برگزیده، آیا پاسخ معتبری پیش بینی می\u200cشود و مسئله\u200cی بیماری از مدرک\u200cهای پاسخ\u200cهای معتبر دیگر بستگی دارد. برای حل این مسائل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که سوالات چندین جواب باز دامنه با یک چهارچوب تصدیق کننده\u200cی یادآوری، که فرآینده\u200cی دلیل\u200cسازی هر جواب را جدا می\u200cکند تا بتوانیم از مدل\u200cهای برداشتن بهتر استفاده کنیم در حالی که مدل\u200cهای بزرگ را تحت یک محدودیت حافظه تح چهارچوب ما نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را در دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متعدد جواب می\u200cدهد، و جواب طلایی بیشتر از یک سیستم خواندن دوباره پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند که از یک مجموعه\u200cای استفاده می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '개방 분야의 문제는 개방적이고 애매모호하여 여러 가지 유효한 답안을 초래할 가능성이 높다.기존의 방법은 보통 선재고 후독의 틀을 채택하고 독자 읽기 순위가 앞선 증거로 답을 예측한다.우리의 실증 분석에 따르면 이 틀은 세 가지 문제에 직면했다. 첫째, 기억의 제약 아래 대형 독자를 이용하기 위해서는 독자가 관련된 몇 개의 단락만 선택하여 서로 다른 답안을 포괄해야 한다. 그러나 관련성과 다양성을 균형 있게 하는 것은 쉽지 않다.그 다음에 작은 읽기 예산은 독자의 방문을 막고 중독자가 거르는 가치 있는 검색 증거를 찾아낸다.셋째, 생성형 독자를 사용하여 모든 선정된 증거에 따라 한 번에 모든 답안을 예측할 때 유효한 답안이 병리학적으로 예측될지는 다른 유효한 답안의 증거에 달려 있다.이러한 문제들을 해결하기 위해 우리는 회상-그리고 검증 프레임워크를 이용하여 개방역 다중 답안 문제에 대답할 것을 권장한다. 이 프레임워크는 모든 답안의 추리 과정을 분리하여 우리가 검색한 증거를 더욱 잘 활용하고 같은 메모리의 제약 아래 대형 모델을 이용할 수 있도록 한다.우리의 프레임워크는 두 개의 다중 답안 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 실현했고oracle reranker를 사용하는 rerank-then-read 시스템보다 훨씬 많은 황금 답안을 예측했다.', 'tr': 'Aç-domain soraglary açyk-soňunda we çykyşsyz bolup biler, birden keçerli jogaba ulaşan. Öň bar golaýmalar adatça, ýene-de-okanan çerçewçigi ullap, bir okaçy jogablary öňünden geçirmek üçin ýokary derejesi okaýar. Biziň empirik analýusymyza görä, bu çerýük üç mesele çykar: ilkinji, ýatlama mümkinçiliginiň a şagynda uly okuwçylara ýetişdirmek üçin, ýene-de taýýarlamak üçin dürli jogablary öretmek üçin diňe birnäçe wajyp geçmegi saýlamaly, relevant çiligi we çeşitliligi t ikinji, kiçi okamak budžety okuwçysynyň ýene-de çykmakçy tarapyndan çykarylýan değerli alınan kanunlara ulaşmagyny engelleýär; Üçünci, bir generativ okuwçysy ulananda hemme cevaplary bir gezek s a ýlanan kanıtlara daşary etmek üçin, gadyry jogabat hem patholojik çaklanacak başga bir karar cevaplaryň kanıtlara bağlı. To address these issues, we propose to answer open-domain multi-answer questions with a recall-then-verify framework, which separates the reasoning process of each answer so that we can make better use of retrieved evidence while also leveraging large models under the same memory constraint. Biziň çerýämiz, sanat sistemasy iki köp-jogabat sanatynyň netijesini ýetip bilýär we kellämizi ýene-de okan sistemasyndan has möhüm bolan altyn jogabalary öngörüp bilýär.', 'sq': 'Open-domain questions are likely to be open-ended and ambiguous, leading to multiple valid answers.  Përqasjet ekzistuese zakonisht miratojnë kuadrin e ripërlidhur-pastaj-lexuar, ku një lexues lexon prova të rangut të lartë për të parashikuar përgjigjet. Sipas analizës tonë empirike, ky kuadër ndeshet me tre probleme: së pari, për të nxitur një lexues të madh nën një kufizim të kujtesës, ripërankeri duhet të zgjedhë vetëm disa pasazhe të rëndësishme për të mbuluar përgjigje të ndryshme, ndërsa balancimi i rëndësisë dhe diversitetit nuk është trivial; së dyti, buxheti i vogël i leximit e pengon lexuesin që të ketë akses në prova të vlefshme të marra të filtruara nga rekrutuesi; s ë treti, kur përdoret një lexues gjenerativ për të parashikuar përgjigjet të gjitha njëherë bazuar në të gjitha provat e zgjedhura, nëse një përgjigje e vlefshme do të parashikohet gjithashtu patologjikisht varet nga provat e disa përgjigjeve të vlefshme të tjera. To address these issues, we propose to answer open-domain multi-answer questions with a recall-then-verify framework, which separates the reasoning process of each answer so that we can make better use of retrieved evidence while also leveraging large models under the same memory constraint.  Korniza jonë arrin rezultate më të mëdha në dy grupe të dhënash me shumë përgjigje dhe parashikon ndjeshëm më shumë përgjigje të art ë se një sistem që përdor një sistem të ri-anketuar-atëherë-lexuar që përdor një orakul të ri-anketuar.', 'af': "Open-domein vrae is waarskynlik na wees oop-einde en onbediende, wat na veelvuldige geldige antwoorde lei. Bestaande toegang tipies aanvaar die herank-dan-lees raamwerk, waar 'n leser lees bo-ranking getuienis om antwoorde te voorskou. Volgens ons empiriese analisie moet hierdie raamwerk drie probleem aangesig: eerste, om 'n groot leser onder 'n geheue beheinde te verwyder, moet die heranker slegs 'n paar relevante wagte kies om verskeie antwoorde te dekk, terwyl balansing van relevante en verskeidigheid is nie-triviaal; tweede, die klein leesbestel verhinder die leesbestel van toegang tot waardelike ontvangbare bevestige wat deur die heranker uitgefiltreer is; en derde, wanneer 'n generaative leeser gebruik word om antwoordes te voorskou op alle gekose bevestige, of 'n geldige antwoord ook pathologiese afhang van bevestige van sommige ander geldige antwoord( s) af. Om hierdie probleme te adres, voorstel ons om open-domein multi-antwoord vrae te antwoord met 'n herhaal-dan-bevestig raamwerk, wat skei die redering proses van elke antwoord sodat ons beter gebruik van ontvangde bevestings kan maak terwyl ons ook groot modele onder dieselfde geheue beperking verwyder. Ons raamwerk bereik status-of-the-art resultate op twee multi-antwoord datastelle, en voorskou betekenlik meer goud antwoorde as 'n herank-dan-lees stelsel wat gebruik 'n orakel heranker.", 'am': 'ክፈት ዶሜን ጥያቄዎች የተከፈቱ እና መፍታት አይቻሉም፡፡ Existing approaches typically adopt the rerank-then-read framework, where a reader reads top-ranking evidence to predict answers.  እንደምናልኩት ትርጓሜያችን፣ ይህ ፍሬም ሦስት ጉዳይ የደረሰ ነው፤ አስቀድሞ፣ ማስታወስ ግድ ካለው ትልቅ አንባቢን ለመስጠት፣ አስቀድሞ የልዩ መልስ ለመሸፍን የሚችሉትን ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩነት ማሰናከል አይፈለገውም፡፡ ሁለተኛ፣ ታናሹ የአንባቢው ቡድስት አንባቢው በኋላው የተጠቀመውን የዋጋውን ማስረጃ እንዳያገኝ ይከለከላል፤ ሦስተኛ፣ የዘረኝነት አንባቢ በመጠቀም ጊዜ ሁሉን በተመረጠው ማስረጃ ሁሉ በመቀበል ላይ መልስ በመጠየቅ ጊዜ፣ ዋጋው መልስ በመስጠት ደግሞ በአካላማዊ መልስ(s) በማስረጃ ላይ ይታመካል፡፡ እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለመጠየቅ፣ የዶሜን መልስ በብዙ ጥያቄዎችን ለመመልስ እንመክራለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ፍሬማችን በሁለት ብዛት የመልስ ዳታተሮች ላይ የልዩ ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Open-domain questions are likely to be open-ended and ambiguous, leading to multiple valid answers.  Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները սովորաբար ընդունում են կրկին կարդալ-ապա-կարդալ համակարգը, որտեղ կարդացողը կարդում է ամենաբարձր ապացույցներ պատասխանների կանխատեսելու համար: Ըստ մեր էմպրիկական վերլուծության, այս շրջանակը հանդիպում է երեք խնդիրների: Առաջինը՝ մեծ կարդացողին հիշողության սահմանափակումների տակ օգտագործելու համար, վերանգծողը պետք է ընտրի միայն մի քանի կարևոր հատվածներ բազմազան պատասխանների ծածկելու համար, մինչդեռ հավասարա երկրորդ, փոքրիկ կարդալու բյուջեսը կանխում է կարդացողին մուտք գործել արժեքավոր հավաքված ապացույցների հետ, որոնք ֆիլտրվում են վերադասավորողի կողմից: երրորդ, երբ սերնդի կարդացողը միաժամանակ պատասխաններ կանխատեսելու համար հիմնված բոլոր ընտրված ապացույցների վրա, արդյոք ճշգրիտ պատասխանը կանխատեսվում է նաև պաթոլոգիապես կախված է որոշ այլ ճշգրիտ պատասխանների ապացույցներից: Այս հարցերի լուծման համար մենք առաջարկում ենք պատասխանել բաց տիեզերքում բազմապատասխանող հարցերին հիշելու-ապա-ստուգելու շրջանակով, որը բաժանում է յուրաքանչյուր պատասխանի մտածողական գործընթացը, որպեսզի մենք ավելի լավ օգտագործենք վերցված ապացույցները, միաժամանակ օգտագործելով մեծ մոդելներ նույն Մեր կառուցվածքը հասնում է ամենակարևոր արդյունքներին երկու բազմապատասխանների տվյալների կառուցվածքում և կանխատեսում է ավելի շատ ոսկու պատասխաններ, քան կրկնօրինակ-ապա-կարդացված համակարգ, որը օգտագործում է օրաքլ-կրկնօրինակ:', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইনের প্রশ্ন সম্ভবত উন্মুক্ত এবং উল্লেখযোগ্য, যার ফলে বেশ কয়েকটি বৈধ উত্তর প্রদান করে। বিদ্যমান প্রতিক্রিয়া সাধারণত পুনরায় পাঠ করা ফ্রেম বেছে নেয়, যেখানে পাঠক প্রমাণ পাঠ করে প্রতিক্রিয়া ভবিষ্যত করতে পারে। আমাদের সম্মানিত বিশ্লেষণ অনুসারে, এই ফ্রেমের সাথে তিনটি সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হয়েছে: প্রথমত, একটি বড় পাঠকের স্মৃতির নীচে পাঠক প্রদান করার জন্য, পুনরায় বেছে নেওয়া উচিত বিভিন দ্বিতীয়, ছোট পাঠবাজেট পাঠকদের মূল্যবান প্রমাণ ফিল্টার প্রবেশ করতে বাধা দিয়েছে; তৃতীয়, যখন একটি জেনারেটিভ পাঠক ব্যবহার করে সকল নির্বাচিত প্রমাণ ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করে, তখন একটি বৈধ উত্তর ভবিষ্যৎ করা  এই সমস্ত বিষয়গুলোর সাথে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি একটি প্রেম-পর্যন্ত-পরীক্ষিত ফ্রেমের মাধ্যমে খোলা ডোমেইনের বহু উত্তর প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিতে, যা প্রত্যেক উত্তরের যুক্তিগত আমাদের ফ্রেমের কার্যক্রম দুটি মাল্টি উত্তরের ডাটাসেটের রাষ্ট্রের ফলাফল অর্জন করে, আর ভবিষ্যৎবাণী করা হয়েছে একটি পুনরায় পাঠ করা সিস্টেমের চেয়ে বেশ', 'bs': 'Pitanja otvorenih domena vjerojatno će biti otvorena i ambigučna, što će dovesti do višestruke vrijedne odgovore. Postojeći pristupi obično usvojavaju okvir prečitanja potom čitanja, gdje čitač čita najvišeg reda dokaze za predviđanje odgovora. Prema našoj empiričkoj analizi, ovaj okvir se suočava sa tri problema: prvo, da bi utjecao na veliki čitač pod ograničenjem pamćenja, prevoditelj treba odabrati samo nekoliko relevantnih prolaza za pokrivanje različitih odgovora, dok je balanciranje relevantnosti i raznolikosti neizbježno; Drugo, mali proračun za čitanje sprječava čitaču pristup vrijednim prikupljenim dokazima filtriranim od strane ponovnog proračunara; Treće, kada koristi generativni čitač za predviđanje odgovora na jednom temelju svih odabranih dokaza, da li će se predviđati validan odgovor također patološki zavisi od dokaza nekih drugih validnih odgovora. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predlažemo odgovoriti na pitanja otvorenog domena multiodgovornih odgovora sa okvirom podsjećanja potom potvrđenog, koji razdvaja razumljivog procesa svakog odgovora tako da možemo bolje iskoristiti prikupljene dokaze, a također utjecati na velike modele pod istom ograničenjem sjećanja. Naš okvir postiže rezultate umjetnosti na dvije višeodgovorne podatke, i predviđa značajno više zlatnih odgovora nego sistem prečitanja i pročitanja koji koristi preuređaj orala.', 'ca': "Probablement les preguntes de domini obert seran obertes i ambigues, portant a múltiples respostes válides. Els enfocaments existents normalment adopten el marc de repetició-llavors-llegir, on un lector llegeix evidències de millor rangper predir respostes. Segons la nostra anàlisi empírica, aquest marc s'enfronta a tres problemes: primer, per aprofitar un lector gran sota una restricció de memòria, l'autoranker només hauria de seleccionar alguns passages rellevants per cobrir respostes diverses, mentre equilibrar la relevància i la diversitat no és trivial; segon, el petit pressupost de lectura impedi al lector d'accedir a valioses proves recuperades filtrats per l'autor; en tercer lloc, quan utilitzem un lector generador per predir respostes totes d'una vegada basades en totes les evidències seleccionadas, si es predirà una resposta válida també depèn patològicament de les evidències d'altres respostes válides. To address these issues, we propose to answer open-domain multi-answer questions with a recall-then-verify framework, which separates the reasoning process of each answer so that we can make better use of retrieved evidence while also leveraging large models under the same memory constraint.  El nostre marc aconsegueix resultats més avançats en dos conjunts de dades multirespostes, i prediu significativament més respostes d'or que un sistema de repetició i llegir que utilitza un oracle repetició.", 'az': 'Açıq-domena sualları açıq-sona və müəyyən olaraq, çoxlu müəyyən cavablara yol açar. Önümüzdeki yaxınlıqlar genellikle yenidən-sonra-oxunduğu çerçevesini qəbul edir. Bir oxuyucu, cavabları öyrənmək üçün ən yüksək dərəcə dəlilləri oxuyur. Bizim empirik analizimizə görə, bu çarşıq üç problemə üz verər: ilk dəfə, yada çətinliklərinin altında böyük oxuyan bir oxuyucu istifadə etmək üçün, yenidən oxuyan ancaq müxtəlif cavab vermək üçün bir neçə məlumat keçirməsi lazımdır, müxtəlif cavab vermək və müxtəlif çətinlikləri müqayisədə müxt ikinci, kiçik oxumaq budžeti oxuyucunun qabiliyyətli alınan dəlillərə istifadə etməsini qadağan edir; Üçüncü, seçilmiş dəlillərə dayanan hər hansı cevapları təmin etmək üçün generiki oxuyan bir oxuyan istifadə etdikdə, həmçinin müəyyən bir cavab təmin ediləcək və ya patolojik olaraq başqa qüvvətli cevapların dəlillərinə bağlı olacaq. Bu məsələləri çəkmək üçün, a çıq-domena çox-cavab sorularına bir neçə-çox cavab vermək üçün təklif edirik ki, hər cavabın razılıq prosesini ayrılır ki, daha yaxşı alınmış dəlillərdən istifadə edək və həmçinin böyük modelləri də aynı yada müəyyən edilməsində istifadə edək. Bizim qurğumuz iki çox cavab verilən verilənlərin müəyyən müddəti sonuçlarına çatdırır və oraqlı yenidən oxuyan sistemdən daha çox qızıl cavablarını təmin edir.', 'cs': 'Otázky otevřené domény jsou pravděpodobně otevřené a nejednoznačné, což vede k několika platným odpovědím. Stávající přístupy obvykle přijímají rámec přezkoumání a přečtení, kde čtenář čte nejvyšší důkazy k předpovědi odpovědí. Podle naší empirické analýzy se tento rámec potýká se třemi problémy: zaprvé, aby využil velkého čtenáře pod omezením paměti, měl by přeskupovač vybrat pouze několik relevantních pasáží, které pokrývají různé odpovědi, zatímco vyvážení relevance a diverzity je netriviální; za druhé, malý rozpočet čtení brání čtenáři v přístupu k cenným získaným důkazům filtrovaným přezkumníkem; Za třetí, pokud používáte generativní čtečku k předpovědi odpovědí všechny najednou na základě všech vybraných důkazů, zda bude platná odpověď předpověděna patologicky závisí i na důkazech nějaké jiné platné odpovědi. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme odpovědět na otázky s otevřenou doménou s více odpovědí pomocí rámce pro odvolání a ověření, který odděluje proces uvažování každé odpovědi tak, abychom mohli lépe využít získané důkazy a zároveň využívat velké modely při stejném omezení paměti. Náš framework dosahuje nejmodernějších výsledků na dvou datových sadách s více odpovědí a předpovídá výrazně více zlatých odpovědí než systém přeřazení a přečtení, který používá přeřazení orákulů.', 'et': 'Avatud domeeniga küsimused on tõenäoliselt avatud ja ebamõistetavad, mis toob kaasa mitu korrektset vastust. Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid kasutavad tavaliselt ümberpankimise ja lugemise raamistikku, kus lugeja loeb vastuste prognoosimiseks kõige paremaid tõendeid. Meie empiirilise analüüsi kohaselt seisab see raamistik silmitsi kolme probleemiga: esiteks, et suurendada suurt lugejat mälupiirangu korral, peaks ümberpanker valima ainult mõned asjakohased lõigud, et hõlmata erinevaid vastuseid, samas kui asjakohasuse ja mitmekesisuse tasakaalustamine ei ole triviaalne; teiseks takistab väike lugemiseelarve lugejal juurdepääsu väärtuslikele hankitud tõenditele, mida ümberpakkuja filtreerib; kolmandaks, kui kasutatakse generatiivset lugejat vastuste prognoosimiseks korraga kõigi valitud tõendite põhjal, sõltub see, kas kehtiv vastus prognoositakse patoloogiliselt ka mõne muu kehtiva vastuse tõendist. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks teeme ettepaneku vastata avatud domeeniga mitme vastusega küsimustele tagasikutsumise ja seejärel kontrollimise raamistiku abil, mis eraldab iga vastuse põhjendusprotsessi, et saaksime paremini ära kasutada saadud tõendeid, kasutades samal ajal suuri mudeleid sama mälupiirangu all. Meie raamistik saavutab kaasaegsed tulemused kahe mitme vastusega andmekogumi puhul ja prognoosib oluliselt rohkem kuldseid vastuseid kui oraakeli ümberpankeerimist kasutav süsteem.', 'fi': 'Avoimen verkkotunnuksen kysymykset ovat todennäköisesti avoimia ja epäselviä, mikä johtaa useisiin päteviin vastauksiin. Nykyiset lähestymistavat käyttävät tyypillisesti uudelleenpankki-sitten-lue-kehystä, jossa lukija lukee korkeimman tason näyttöä ennustaakseen vastauksia. Empiirisen analyysimme mukaan tähän viitekehykseen liittyy kolme ongelmaa: ensinnäkin suuren lukijan hyödyntämiseksi muistirajoituksen alaisena uudelleenjärjestäjän tulisi valita vain muutama relevantti osio, jotka kattavat monipuoliset vastaukset, samalla kun relevanssin ja monimuotoisuuden tasapainottaminen ei ole triviaalia. Toiseksi pieni lukubudjetti estää lukijaa pääsemästä käsiksi arvokkaisiin haettuihin todisteisiin, jotka uudelleenpankkiiri suodattaa pois; Kolmanneksi, kun generatiivinen lukija ennustaa vastauksia kerralla kaikkien valittujen todisteiden perusteella, riippuu myös patologisesti todisteista, onko pätevä vastaus ennustettu. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme avoimen verkkotunnuksen monivastauskysymyksiin vastaamista palautus-sitten-verify-kehyksellä, joka erottaa jokaisen vastauksen päättelyprosessin, jotta voimme hyödyntää paremmin haettua näyttöä ja hyödyntää samalla suuria malleja saman muistirajoituksen alaisena. Kehyksemme saavuttaa huipputason tulokset kahdesta monivastausaineistosta ja ennustaa huomattavasti enemmän kultaisia vastauksia kuin oraakkeliuudelleenverkkolaitetta käyttävä uudelleenpankkijärjestelmä.', 'jv': 'Open-domain question are likely to be open-end and mbiguent, guiding to Multiple valid responses. buddy Tulung tanggal empirhik ngetang Genjer-tool To Address this question, we proposal to question open Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing perusahaan -perusahaan-perusahaan iki dadi multi-responsi, lan supoyo barang langgampang luwih apik dhéwé karo sistem sing perusahaan langgambar uwis.', 'he': 'שאלות בתחום פתוח סביר להניח שיהיו פתוחות ושambiguous, מה שמוביל למספר תשובות נכונות. גישות קיימות אומצות בדרך כלל את המסגרת הקריאה מחדש, שבו קורא ראיות מדרגה גבוהה כדי לחזות תשובות. According to our empirical analysis, this framework faces three problems: first, to leverage a large reader under a memory constraint, the reranker should select only a few relevant passages to cover diverse answers, while balancing relevance and diversity is non-trivial;  שנית, תקציב הקריאה הקטן מונע מהקורא לגשת לראיות חסרות ערך שמסוננות על ידי הקרסול מחדש; שלישית, כשמשתמשים בקורא דור כדי לחזות תשובות בכל פעם בהתבסס על כל הראיות שנבחרו, האם תשובה קבועה תיחזה גם באופן פתולוגי תלוי בראיות של תשובה(ות) קבועה(ות) אחרת. כדי להתמודד עם הנושאים האלה, אנו מציעים לענות על שאלות עם תשובות רבות בתחום פתוח עם סגרת זיכרון-ואז-אבדק, שמפרידה את תהליך ההגיון של כל תשובה כדי שנוכל להשתמש טוב יותר בראיות השיגות בזמן גם להשתמש בדוגמנים גדולים תחת אותו מגבלת זיכרון. המסגרת שלנו משיגה תוצאות מוקדמות על שני קבוצות נתונים רבות תשובות, וחזות יותר תשובות זהב משמעותית שקוראת מחדש ושתמשת במסגרת אורקל מחדש.', 'sk': 'Vprašanja z odprto domeno so verjetno odprta in dvoumna, kar vodi do več veljavnih odgovorov. Obstoječi pristopi običajno uporabljajo okvir za ponovno bankiranje in nato branje, kjer bralec bere najboljše dokaze za napoved odgovorov. Glede na našo empirično analizo se ta okvir sooča s tremi težavami: prvič, da bi vzpostavil velik bralnik pod omejitvijo pomnilnika, bi moral ponovno bankiranje izbrati le nekaj ustreznih odlomkov, ki bi pokrili različne odgovore, medtem ko je uravnoteženje relevantnosti in raznolikosti netrivialno; drugič, majhen proračun branja bralcu preprečuje dostop do dragocenih pridobljenih dokazov, ki jih filtrira ponovni banker; tretjič, pri uporabi generativnega bralnika za napovedovanje odgovorov naenkrat na podlagi vseh izbranih dokazov je, ali bo veljaven odgovor napovedan patološko, odvisno tudi od dokazov o drugih veljavnih odgovorih. Za reševanje teh vprašanj predlagamo odgovore na vprašanja z več odgovori na odprto domeno z okvirom za odpoklic in nato preverjanje, ki ločuje postopek razmišljanja vsakega odgovora, tako da lahko bolje izkoristimo pridobljene dokaze in hkrati izkoristimo velike modele pod isto omejitvijo pomnilnika. Naš okvir dosega najsodobnejše rezultate na dveh naborih podatkov z več odgovori in napoveduje bistveno več zlatih odgovorov kot sistem ponovnega branja, ki uporablja preračunalnik orakle.', 'ha': "QRegExp Idan yana da amfani da shi, sai ka yi amfani da firam ɗin-sake-karatun, a inda wani mai karatun yana karatun shaidar da ke danganta a sarki dõmin ya yi bashi. Li gori da anarwa na empirical, wannan firam yana haɗa matsayi uku: farko, dõmin a sami karatun mai girma a bakin memory, ya kamata ya zãɓi hanya kaɗan da muhimmi dõmin ya rufe majibu masu yawa, kuma ma'anar daidaita matsayi da da bakwaici, ba ya zama mai amfani ba; secondn, bajetan ƙarami na karanta ya hana karatun ya iya haɗa bayanin da aka zo da kima da aka filterar da shi wanda ya sake shi; na ukunsa, idan ya yi amfani da wani mai karatun matsayi mai ɗabi'a wa ya yi gafaka kowa a kan duk bayani na zaɓi, za'a ƙayyade cewa cewa mai maras inganci tare da ƙayyade bayani na shaidar wasu masu inganci. Dõmin su yi tambaya ga masu yiwuwa, Munã bukãta mu karɓa wa maswali masu buɗewa na guda-Domen da firam mai maras da za'a gaskata-bayan-bayan, wanda ke rarraba jararin masu inganci na zartar da duk jabu, dõmin mu iya amfani da shaidar da aka samu a lokacin da za'a sami motsi masu girma a ƙarƙashin kumbar. Firammananmu yana sãmu fassarar-sanar a kan danne biyu masu mulki, kuma yana yi gargaɗi da masu yawa ga majibu na zĩnãriya ko da tsarin ya sake-kara-duba mai amfani da wani mai saukarwa.", 'bo': 'Open-domain questions are likely to be open-ended and ambiguous, leading to multiple valid answers. Existing approaches are typically adopted the rerank-then-read framework, where a reader reads top-ranking evidence to predict answers. According to our empirical analysis, this framework faces three problems: first, to leverage a large reader under a memory constraint, the reranker should select only a few relevant passages to cover various answers, while balancing relevance and diversity is non-trivial; while balancing relevance and diversity གཉིས་པ། ཀློག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཆུང་ཆུང་གིས་ཀློག་འཇུག་པ་ལ་འཛུལ་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་ལྟ་བུ་དང་། གསུམ་པ་དང་། བཟོ་བཅོས་ཀློག་འཇུག་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྔོན་འཛིན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་རྣམས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་ཡིག To address these issues, we propose to answer open-domain multi-answer questions with a recall-then-verify framework, which separates the reasoning process of each answer so that we can make better use of retrieved evidence while also leveraging large models under the same memory constraint. ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གཞུང་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ལ་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་ཡང་བསྐྱར་འབྲི་མ་ལག་'}
{'en': 'How Do ', 'pt': 'Sondagem como quantificação de viés indutivo', 'ar': 'التحقيق كمقياس للتحيز الاستقرائي', 'es': 'Sondeo como cuantificación del sesgo inductivo', 'fr': 'Sondage en tant que quantification du biais inductif', 'zh': '为量化电感偏差之测', 'ja': '量子化誘導バイアスとしてのプローブ', 'hi': 'आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रह को परिमाणित करने के रूप में जांच', 'ru': 'Зондирование в качестве количественного определения индуктивной погрешности', 'ga': 'Scrúdú mar Laofacht Ionduchtach Cainníochtúil', 'ka': 'როგორც კვანტიფიკაცია ინდექტუტიური ბუნები', 'hu': 'Szondázás induktív Bias mennyiségének meghatározásaként', 'el': 'Δοκιμή ως ποσοτικός προσδιορισμός επαγωγικής προκατάληψης', 'it': 'Sondaggio come bias induttivo quantificante', 'kk': 'Масштабтау көлемі', 'lt': 'Bandymas kaip kiekybinių indukcinių kliūčių nustatymas', 'mk': 'Истражување како квантификувачки индуктивни пречки', 'ms': 'Mencoba sebagai Pengkuantifikasi Bias Induktif', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന ബിയാസുകളായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-ipproċessar bħala Kwantifikazzjoni tal-Biż Induttiv', 'mn': 'Ингээд хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний', 'no': 'Prøver som kvantifikasjon av indikativ bitar', 'ro': 'Sondarea ca fiind cuantificarea biasului inductiv', 'pl': 'Sondowanie jako ilościowe białości indukcyjne', 'sv': 'Probinering som kvantifiering av induktiv bias', 'sr': 'Verovatno kvantificirajuæi induktivne bice', 'so': 'Bias', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிடுதல் சுட்டும் பையாக உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ur': 'آزمائش کے طور پر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hành Quantico suy đoán', 'bg': 'Проучване като количествено индуктивно отклонение', 'nl': 'Proberen als kwantificeren van inductieve bias', 'da': 'Sonding som kvantificering af induktiv bias', 'hr': 'Vjerojatno kvantificirajući Induktivne Bias', 'de': 'Sondierung als Quantifizierung induktiver Bias', 'ko': '양적 귀납 편차의 탐색으로 삼다', 'id': 'Probing as Quantifying Inductive Bias', 'fa': 'تحقیق به عنوان مقدار اندازه\u200cگیری دوره\u200cهای ناتوانی', 'tr': 'Phonon::', 'af': 'Probeer as Quantifiering Induktiewe Bias', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza kama Bias', 'hy': 'Probing as Quantifying Inductive Bias', 'sq': 'Duke provuar si shkatërrim kuantifikues induktiv', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'bn': 'ইন্ডিয়েটিভ বিয়াস হিসেবে প্রক্রিয়া করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Probar com a inconvenients inductius quantificats', 'bs': 'Vjerojatno kvantificirajući Induktivne Bias', 'cs': 'Snímání jako kvantifikace indukčních biasů', 'et': 'Proovimine kui induktiivne eelarvamus', 'fi': 'Induktiivisen harhan mittaaminen', 'az': 'Q캼ymetl톛ndirm톛k 칲칞칲n', 'jv': 'libpurple/request.h', 'he': 'Probing as Quantifying Inductive Bias', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Sondiranje kot količinsko določanje induktivnih pristranskosti', 'bo': 'Probing as Quantifying Inductive Bias'}
{'en': 'With the rapid development of deep learning, Seq2Seq paradigm has become prevalent for end-to-end data-to-text generation, and the BLEU scores have been increasing in recent years. However, it is widely recognized that there is still a gap between the quality of the texts generated by models and the texts written by human. In order to better understand the ability of Seq2Seq models, evaluate their performance and analyze the results, we choose to use Multidimensional Quality Metric(MQM) to evaluate several representative Seq2Seq models on end-to-end data-to-text generation. We annotate the outputs of five models on four datasets with eight error types and find that 1) copy mechanism is helpful for the improvement in Omission and Inaccuracy Extrinsic errors but it increases other types of errors such as Addition; 2) pre-training techniques are highly effective, and pre-training strategy and model size are very significant; 3) the structure of the dataset also influences the model’s performance greatly; 4) some specific types of errors are generally challenging for seq2seq models.', 'ar': 'أدت التمثيلات السياقية المدربة مسبقًا إلى تحسينات كبيرة في الأداء في مجموعة من المهام النهائية. حفزت تحسينات الأداء هذه الباحثين على تحديد وفهم المعلومات اللغوية المشفرة في هذه التمثيلات. بشكل عام ، يحدد الباحثون كمية المعلومات اللغوية من خلال الاستقصاء ، وهو مسعى يتكون من تدريب نموذج خاضع للإشراف للتنبؤ بخاصية لغوية مباشرة من التمثيلات السياقية. لسوء الحظ ، تعرض هذا التعريف للتحقيق لانتقادات واسعة النطاق في الأدبيات ، وقد لوحظ أنه يؤدي إلى نتائج متناقضة وغير بديهية. في الجزء النظري من هذه الورقة ، نتخذ الموقف القائل بأن هدف الفحص يجب أن يكون قياس مقدار التحيز الاستقرائي الذي ترمزه التمثيلات في مهمة معينة. وصفنا كذلك إطار عمل بايز الذي يعمل على تفعيل هذا الهدف ويسمح لنا بتحديد التحيز الاستقرائي للتمثيلات. في الجزء التجريبي من الورقة ، نطبق إطار عملنا على مجموعة متنوعة من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. تشير نتائجنا إلى أن إطار عملنا المقترح يخفف العديد من المشكلات السابقة الموجودة في التحقيق. علاوة على ذلك ، نحن قادرون على تقديم دليل ملموس على أن - بالنسبة لبعض المهام - يمكن للنص السريع أن يقدم تحيزًا استقرائيًا أفضل من BERT.', 'es': 'Las representaciones contextuales previamente entrenadas han llevado a mejoras dramáticas del rendimiento en una serie de tareas posteriores. Estas mejoras en el rendimiento han motivado a los investigadores a cuantificar y comprender la información lingüística codificada en estas representaciones. En general, los investigadores cuantifican la cantidad de información lingüística a través del sondeo, un esfuerzo que consiste en entrenar un modelo supervisado para predecir una propiedad lingüística directamente a partir de las representaciones contextuales. Desafortunadamente, esta definición de sondeo ha sido objeto de amplias críticas en la literatura, y se ha observado que conduce a resultados paradójicas y contradictorios. En la parte teórica de este artículo, adoptamos la posición de que el objetivo del sondeo debe ser medir la cantidad de sesgo inductivo que las representaciones codifican en una tarea específica. Describimos con más detalle un marco bayesiano que operacionaliza este objetivo y nos permite cuantificar el sesgo inductivo de las representaciones. En la parte empírica del documento, aplicamos nuestro marco a una variedad de tareas de PNL. Nuestros resultados sugieren que nuestro marco propuesto alivia muchos problemas anteriores encontrados en el sondeo. Además, podemos ofrecer evidencia concreta de que, para algunas tareas, FastText puede ofrecer un mejor sesgo inductivo que BERT.', 'fr': "Les représentations contextuelles pré-entraînées ont permis d'améliorer considérablement les performances d'une série de tâches en aval. Ces améliorations de performance ont incité les chercheurs à quantifier et à comprendre les informations linguistiques codées dans ces représentations. En général, les chercheurs quantifient la quantité d'informations linguistiques par sondage, un effort qui consiste à former un modèle supervisé pour prédire une propriété linguistique directement à partir des représentations contextuelles. Malheureusement, cette définition du sondage a fait l'objet de nombreuses critiques dans la littérature et on a observé qu'elle conduisait à des résultats paradoxaux et contre-intuitifs. Dans la partie théorique de cet article, nous partons de la position que le but du sondage devrait être de mesurer la quantité de biais inductif que les représentations codent pour une tâche spécifique. Nous décrivons également un cadre bayésien qui concrétise cet objectif et nous permet de quantifier le biais inductif des représentations. Dans la partie empirique de l'article, nous appliquons notre cadre à diverses tâches de PNL. Nos résultats suggèrent que le cadre que nous proposons atténue de nombreux problèmes antérieurs rencontrés lors de l'exploration. De plus, nous sommes en mesure de fournir des preuves concrètes que, pour certaines tâches, FastText peut offrir un meilleur biais inductif que le BERT.", 'pt': 'As representações contextuais pré-treinadas levaram a melhorias dramáticas de desempenho em uma série de tarefas downstream. Tais melhorias de desempenho motivaram pesquisadores a quantificar e compreender as informações linguísticas codificadas nessas representações. Em geral, os pesquisadores quantificam a quantidade de informação linguística por meio de sondagem, um esforço que consiste em treinar um modelo supervisionado para prever uma propriedade linguística diretamente das representações contextuais. Infelizmente, essa definição de sondagem tem sido objeto de extensas críticas na literatura e tem sido observada para levar a resultados paradoxais e contra-intuitivos. Na parte teórica deste artigo, tomamos a posição de que o objetivo da sondagem deve ser medir a quantidade de viés indutivo que as representações codificam em uma tarefa específica. Descrevemos ainda um framework bayesiano que operacionaliza esse objetivo e nos permite quantificar o viés indutivo das representações. Na parte empírica do artigo, aplicamos nossa estrutura a uma variedade de tarefas de PNL. Nossos resultados sugerem que nosso framework proposto alivia muitos problemas anteriores encontrados na sondagem. Além disso, podemos oferecer evidências concretas de que --- para algumas tarefas --- o fastText pode oferecer um viés indutivo melhor do que o BERT.', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングを受けたコンテキスト表現は、一連のダウンストリームタスクのパフォーマンスを劇的に向上させました。 このようなパフォーマンスの向上は、研究者がこれらの表現に符号化された言語情報を定量化し、理解する動機となっている。 一般に、研究者は、文脈表現から直接言語特性を予測するために監視モデルを訓練することからなる探究を通じて言語情報の量を定量化する。 残念ながら、このプロービングの定義は、文献で広範な批判を受けており、逆説的および反直観的な結果につながることが観察されている。 この論文の理論的部分では、探索の目標は、表現が特定のタスクにコードする帰納的バイアスの量を測定することであるべきであるという立場をとる。 さらに、この目標を実用化し、表現の帰納的バイアスを定量化することを可能にするベイズの枠組みについて説明します。 論文の実証的な部分では、私たちのフレームワークを様々なNLPタスクに適用します。 私たちの結果は、提案されたフレームワークがプロービングで見つかった多くの以前の問題を緩和することを示唆しています。 さらに、いくつかのタスクについて、- fastTextはBERTよりも優れた帰納的バイアスを提供できるという具体的な証拠を提供することができます。', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक अभ्यावेदन ने डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों की एक श्रृंखला पर नाटकीय प्रदर्शन सुधार का नेतृत्व किया है। इस तरह के प्रदर्शन में सुधार ने शोधकर्ताओं को इन अभ्यावेदनों में एन्कोड की गई भाषाई जानकारी को मापने और समझने के लिए प्रेरित किया है। सामान्य तौर पर, शोधकर्ता जांच के माध्यम से भाषाई जानकारी की मात्रा को निर्धारित करते हैं, एक प्रयास जिसमें प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व से सीधे भाषाई संपत्ति की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करना शामिल है। दुर्भाग्य से, जांच की यह परिभाषा साहित्य में व्यापक आलोचना के अधीन रही है, और विरोधाभासी और काउंटर-सहज ज्ञान युक्त परिणामों को जन्म देने के लिए देखी गई है। इस पेपर के सैद्धांतिक भाग में, हम यह स्थिति लेते हैं कि जांच का लक्ष्य आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रह की मात्रा को मापना चाहिए जो प्रतिनिधित्व एक विशिष्ट कार्य पर एन्कोड करते हैं। हम आगे एक बायेसियन ढांचे का वर्णन करते हैं जो इस लक्ष्य को संचालित करता है और हमें प्रतिनिधित्व के आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रह को मापने की अनुमति देता है। पेपर के अनुभवजन्य भाग में, हम विभिन्न प्रकार के एनएलपी कार्यों के लिए अपने ढांचे को लागू करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्तावित ढांचा जांच में पाई जाने वाली कई पिछली समस्याओं को कम करता है। इसके अलावा, हम ठोस सबूत पेश करने में सक्षम हैं कि--- कुछ कार्यों के लिए---फास्टटेक्स्ट BERT की तुलना में एक बेहतर आगमनात्मक पूर्वाग्रह प्रदान कर सकता है।', 'zh': '先训者上下文示列下流之性也。 更促人量化解中编码语。 凡治人量化言息之数,教督上下文以占言性。 不幸者,探义博讥于文献,且观隙反直觉之效也。 于本文之论,吾取之者,探测当测表征于特定务编码之归差也。 更述一贝叶斯框架,当框架得所向,许以量化归纳偏差。 本文实证,以吾框架应用诸NLP。 臣等之的结果表明,臣等所陈框架缓前所探见者甚众。 此外可供事证---于某事---fastText可供BERT归偏。', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные контекстуальные представления привели к резкому улучшению производительности по целому ряду последующих задач. Такие улучшения производительности мотивировали исследователей количественно оценивать и понимать лингвистическую информацию, закодированную в этих представлениях. В целом, исследователи количественно оценивают объем лингвистической информации с помощью зондирования, которое состоит из обучения контролируемой модели предсказания лингвистического свойства непосредственно из контекстуальных представлений. К сожалению, это определение зондирования подверглось обширной критике в литературе и, как было замечено, привело к парадоксальным и противоречащим интуиции результатам. В теоретической части этой статьи мы занимаем позицию, что целью зондирования должно быть измерение величины индуктивного смещения, которое кодируют представления в конкретной задаче. Мы далее описываем байесовскую структуру, которая реализует эту цель и позволяет нам количественно оценить индуктивное смещение представлений. В эмпирической части статьи мы применяем нашу структуру к различным задачам NLP. Наши результаты свидетельствуют о том, что предлагаемые нами рамки облегчают многие проблемы, выявленные в ходе зондирования. Более того, мы можем предложить конкретные доказательства того, что - для некоторых задач - быстрый текст может предложить лучшее индуктивное смещение, чем БЕРТ.', 'ga': 'Mar thoradh ar léirithe comhthéacsúla réamhoilte tá feabhsuithe suntasacha ar fheidhmíocht ar raon tascanna iartheachtacha. Spreag feabhsuithe feidhmíochta den sórt sin taighdeoirí chun an t-eolas teangeolaíoch atá ionchódaithe sna léirithe seo a chainníochtú agus a thuiscint. Go ginearálta, déanann taighdeoirí méid na faisnéise teangeolaíochta a chainníochtú trí iniúchadh, iarracht atá comhdhéanta de mhúnla maoirsithe a oiliúint chun airí teanga a thuar go díreach ó na léirithe comhthéacsúla. Ar an drochuair, tá an sainmhíniú seo ar thaiscéalaíocht faoi réir cáineadh forleathan sa litríocht, agus breathnaíodh go bhfuil torthaí paradoxical agus frith-iomasach mar thoradh air. Sa chuid theoiriciúil den pháipéar seo, glacaimid leis an seasamh gur cheart gurb é an sprioc le scrúdú a dhéanamh ar an méid de laofacht ionduchtach a ionchódaíonn na huiríll ar thasc ar leith. Déanaimid cur síos breise ar chreat Bayesian a fheidhmíonn an sprioc seo agus a cheadaíonn dúinn laofacht ionduchtach na n-uiríoll a chainníochtú. Sa chuid eimpíreach den pháipéar, cuirimid ár gcreat i bhfeidhm ar éagsúlacht tascanna NLP. Tugann ár dtorthaí le fios go maolaíonn ár gcreat molta go leor fadhbanna a fuarthas roimhe seo le linn an tseiceáil. Ina theannta sin, táimid in ann fianaise nithiúil a thairiscint gur féidir --- i gcás roinnt tascanna --- FastText claonadh ionduchtach níos fearr a thairiscint ná BERT.', 'ka': 'პროგრამეტური კონტექსტური გამოსახულებები გავაკეთეთ დირამატიკური კონტექსტური კონტექსტურების უფრო მეტადებაში. ასეთი პროცესტის შესაძლებლობა მოტივირებულია მსწავლობელი, რომლებიც კვანტიფიკაციას და გავიგოთ ლენგურისტიკური ინფორმაციას, რომლებიც ამ გამოსახულებ ყველაფერად, მსწავლებელი ინფორმაციის რაოდენობას კვანტიფიცირებენ, რომელიც შეიძლება დააკეთებული მოდელზე, რომელიც კონტექსტური გამოსახულებებიდან ინფორმაციის მნიშვნელობის მნიშვნელობას განა მართლად, ეს პრობენტის განსაზღვრება უფრო დიდი კრიტიკური ლიტერტურაში იყო, და მონაცემულია, რომ პარაოქსიკური და კონტუტიური წარმოდგენა. ამ დომენტის თეორეტიკური ნაწილში, ჩვენ მივიღეთ პოზაციას, რომელიც პრობენტის მიზეზი უნდა იყოს ინდიქტური წარმოდგენების რაოდენობას, რომელიც განსაკუთრებულია განსაკუთ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ბეიზიანური ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ამ მიზეზის პერაციალურად გავაკეთებთ და ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთებთ გამოსახულებების ინდექტიური წინასწორება ჩვენ ჩვენი პარამეტრები NLP-ის განსხვავებულ სამუშაოში დავყენებთ. ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენული პარამეტრები უფრო წინა პრობლემების გახსნა. დამატებით, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია დავიტანოთ კონკრეტული წარმოდგენები, რომ--- რამდენიმე საქმებისთვის--- FastText შეგვიძლია უფრო სუფლებელი ინდიქტური წარმოდგ', 'el': 'Οι προ-εκπαιδευμένες αναπαραστάσεις του περιβάλλοντος έχουν οδηγήσει σε δραματικές βελτιώσεις απόδοσης σε μια σειρά μεταγενέστερων εργασιών. Τέτοιες βελτιώσεις απόδοσης έχουν παρακινήσει τους ερευνητές να ποσοτικοποιήσουν και να κατανοήσουν τις γλωσσικές πληροφορίες που κωδικοποιούνται σε αυτές τις αναπαραστάσεις. Σε γενικές γραμμές, οι ερευνητές ποσοτικοποιούν την ποσότητα των γλωσσικών πληροφοριών μέσω της ανίχνευσης, μια προσπάθεια που συνίσταται στην εκπαίδευση ενός εποπτευόμενου μοντέλου για να προβλέψει μια γλωσσική ιδιότητα απευθείας από τις περιεκτικές αναπαραστάσεις. Δυστυχώς, αυτός ο ορισμός της διερεύνησης έχει υποβληθεί σε εκτεταμένη κριτική στη βιβλιογραφία και έχει παρατηρηθεί ότι οδηγεί σε παράδοξα και αντιφατικά αποτελέσματα. Στο θεωρητικό μέρος αυτής της εργασίας, παίρνουμε τη θέση ότι ο στόχος της ανίχνευσης πρέπει να είναι η μέτρηση του ποσού της επαγωγικής προκατάλειψης που κωδικοποιούν οι αναπαραστάσεις σε μια συγκεκριμένη εργασία. Περιγράφουμε περαιτέρω ένα Bayesian πλαίσιο που λειτουργικοποιεί αυτόν τον στόχο και μας επιτρέπει να ποσοτικοποιήσουμε την επαγωγική προκατάληψη των αναπαραστάσεων. Στο εμπειρικό μέρος της εργασίας, εφαρμόζουμε το πλαίσιο μας σε ποικίλες εργασίες NLP. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο ανακουφίζει πολλά προηγούμενα προβλήματα που βρέθηκαν στην έρευνα. Επιπλέον, είμαστε σε θέση να προσφέρουμε συγκεκριμένες αποδείξεις ότι--για ορισμένες εργασίες--το γρήγορο κείμενο μπορεί να προσφέρει μια καλύτερη επαγωγική προκατάληψη από το BERT.', 'hu': 'Az előre képzett kontextuális ábrázolások drámai teljesítményjavulást eredményeztek számos downstream feladat esetében. Az ilyen teljesítményfejlesztések arra ösztönözték a kutatókat, hogy számszerűsítsék és megértsék az ezekben a reprezentációkban kódolt nyelvi információkat. Általában a kutatók számszerűsítik a nyelvi információk mennyiségét a szondázással, amely egy felügyelt modell kiképzéséből áll, hogy közvetlenül a kontextuális reprezentációkból megjósolja a nyelvi tulajdonságokat. Sajnos a szondázás e definíciójának kiterjedt kritikája volt az irodalomban, és megfigyelték, hogy paradox és ellenintuitív eredményekhez vezet. A tanulmány elméleti részében azt az álláspontot foglaljuk el, hogy a vizsgálat célja az induktív torzítás mérése, amelyet a reprezentációk egy adott feladatra kódolnak. Továbbá olyan bayesiai keretrendszert írunk le, amely operationalizálja ezt a célt, és lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy számszerűsítsük a reprezentációk induktív elfogultságát. A tanulmány empirikus részében keretrendszerünket különböző NLP feladatokra alkalmazzuk. Eredményeink azt sugallják, hogy javasolt keretrendszerünk számos korábbi problémát enyhít a vizsgálat során. Ezenkívül konkrét bizonyítékot tudunk nyújtani arra, hogy---bizonyos feladatokhoz---fastText jobb induktív elfogultságot tud nyújtani, mint a BERT.', 'it': "Rappresentazioni contestuali pre-addestrate hanno portato a notevoli miglioramenti delle prestazioni su una serie di attività a valle. Tali miglioramenti delle prestazioni hanno motivato i ricercatori a quantificare e comprendere le informazioni linguistiche codificate in queste rappresentazioni. In generale, i ricercatori quantificano la quantità di informazioni linguistiche attraverso il sonding, uno sforzo che consiste nella formazione di un modello supervisionato per prevedere una proprietà linguistica direttamente dalle rappresentazioni contestuali. Purtroppo, questa definizione di sonding è stata oggetto di ampie critiche in letteratura, ed è stato osservato portare a risultati paradossali e controintuitivi. Nella parte teorica di questo articolo, prendiamo la posizione che l'obiettivo della sonda dovrebbe essere misurare la quantità di bias induttivi che le rappresentazioni codificano su un compito specifico. Descriviamo inoltre un framework bayesiano che attualizza questo obiettivo e ci permette di quantificare il bias induttivo delle rappresentazioni. Nella parte empirica dell'articolo, applichiamo il nostro framework a una varietà di compiti NLP. I nostri risultati suggeriscono che il nostro framework proposto allevia molti problemi precedenti riscontrati nel sondaggio. Inoltre, siamo in grado di offrire prove concrete che---per alcuni compiti---fastText può offrire un bias induttivo migliore di BERT.", 'kk': 'Алдыңғы бағытталған контексті таңбалар бірнеше тапсырмалардың арасында драматикалық істеу жақсартылығын өзгертеді. Бұл әрекеттің жақсартулары зерттеушілерді көптеген мәліметті түсінуге және түсінуге мүмкіндік береді. Жалпы зерттеушілер тексеру арқылы лингвистикалық мәліметтердің санатын анықтайды. Бұл әрекетті тексеру үшін лингвистикалық қасиетті тексеру үшін тәжірибелерінен тәжірибелеу үшін тәжірибелері. Кешіріңіз, бұл сынақтардың анықтамасы әдебиеттің көптеген критикалық болды, және парадоксиялық және қарсы интуитивтік нәтижелеріне қатысты. Бұл қағаздың теоретикалық бөлігінде, біз тексеру мақсатының бір тапсырманың кодтамасының индуктивті бөлігін өлшеу керек болады. Біз бұл мақсатты орындау үшін Байезиялық қоршауын таңдап, келтірілгендердің индуктивті қарсы саны беруге мүмкіндік береміз. Қағаздың эмпирикалық бөлігінда, біз қоршауымызды NLP тапсырмаларына қолданып тұрмыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз қолданылатын фрейміміз сынақтағы бірнеше мәселелерді көмектеседі. Сонымен қатар, біз кейбір тапсырмалар үшін кейбір жұмыс істеу үшін - FastText BERT-ден артық жұмыс істеу мүмкіндігін жеткізе аламыз.', 'mk': "Претренираните контекстуални претставувања доведоа до драматични подобрувања на перформансите на голем број задачи. Таквите подобрувања на перформансата ги мотивираа истражувачите да ги квантификуваат и разберат јазичните информации кодирани во овие претставувања. Генерално, истражувачите ја квантификуваат количината на јазични информации преку истражување, напор кој се состои од обука на надгледуван модел за предвидување на јазичната сопственост директно од контекстуалните претставувања. За жал, оваа дефиниција на истражување е предмет на екстремни критики во литературата и се набљудува дека води до парадоксични и контра-интуитивни резултати. Во теоретскиот дел од оваа хартија, ние ја преземаме позицијата дека целта на истражување треба да биде мерење на количината на индуктивни предрасуди што претставувањата ги кодираат на специфична задача. We further describe a Bayesian framework that operationalizes this goal and allows us to quantify the representations' inductive bias.  Во империскиот дел од весникот, ја применуваме нашата рамка на различни NLP задачи. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека нашата предложена рамка олеснува многу претходни проблеми откриени во истражувањето. Покрај тоа, можеме да понудиме конкретни докази дека -- за некои задачи -- брз Текст може да понуди подобра индуктивна предрасуда од БЕРТ.", 'lt': 'Iš anksto apmokyti kontekstiniai atstovai labai pagerino veiklos rezultatus įvairiose tolesnėse veiklos srityse. Tokie rezultatų gerinimai paskatino mokslininkus kiekybiškai įvertinti ir suprasti šiose atstovybėse koduotą kalbinę informaciją. Apskritai mokslo darbuotojai kiekybiškai vertina kalbinės informacijos kiekį atliekant tyrimą, kuris apima mokymą prižiūrėtu modeliu, skirtu tiesiogiai iš kontekstinių atstovybių prognozuoti kalbinę savybę. Deja, šis tyrimo apibrėžimas buvo labai kritikuotas literatūroje ir buvo pastebėta, kad jis sukėlparadoksinių ir priešingų intuityvinių rezultatų. Teoriškoje šio dokumento dalyje mes laikomės pozicijos, kad bandymo tikslas turėtų būti išmatuoti induktyvinio nukreipimo kiekį, kurį reprezentacijos koduoja konkrečiai užduotims. Be to, apibūdiname Bayezijos sistemą, kuri įgyvendina šį tikslą ir leidžia mums kiekybiškai įvertinti reprezentacijų induktyvų pusiausvyrą. Empirinėje dokumento dalyje taikome savo sistemą įvairioms NLP užduotims. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūloma sistema palengvina daugelį ankstesnių tyrimų problemų. Be to, mes galime pasiūlyti konkrečių įrodymų, kad -- kai kurių užduočių atveju -- fastText gali pasiūlyti geresnį skatinamąjį nukreipimą nei BERT.', 'ms': 'Pre-trained contextual representations have led to dramatic performance improvements on a range of downstream tasks.  Perbaikan prestasi seperti ini telah mendorong penyelidik untuk kuantifikasikan dan memahami maklumat bahasa yang terkod dalam perwakilan ini. Secara umum, penyelidik kuantifikasikan jumlah maklumat bahasa melalui penyelidikan, usaha yang terdiri daripada melatih model yang diawasi untuk meramalkan sifat bahasa secara langsung dari perwakilan kontekstual. Malangnya, definisi penyelidikan ini telah mengalami kritik yang luas dalam literatur, dan telah diperhatikan untuk membawa kepada keputusan paradoksal dan melawan intuitif. Dalam bahagian teori kertas ini, kita mengambil kedudukan bahawa tujuan penyelidikan sepatutnya mengukur jumlah bias induktif yang perwakilan mengekodkan pada tugas tertentu. Kami menggambarkan kerangka Bayesia yang memoperasikan tujuan ini dan membolehkan kita kuantifikasikan bias induktif perwakilan. Dalam bahagian empirik kertas, kami melaksanakan kerangka kami untuk berbagai tugas NLP. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kami diusulkan mengurangi banyak masalah terdahulu yang ditemui dalam penyelidikan. Moreover, we are able to offer concrete evidence that---for some tasks---fastText can offer a better inductive bias than BERT.', 'ml': 'മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട കാലാവധി പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് താഴ്വരയുടെ ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ പ്രദര്\u200dശനങ്ങള്\u200d മെച് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ഈ പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d എളുപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഭാ പൊതുവായി, അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിലൂടെ ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ എത്ര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. നേരിട്ടുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും നേരിട നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, ഈ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണം സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d വിശാലമായ സമീപത്തിന്റെ കീഴടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പാരാഡോക്സിക്കല്\u200d വി ഈ പത്രത്തിലെ തിയോറിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d, പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം പ്രത്യേക പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ജോലിയില്\u200d കോഡി ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുട പേപ്പറിന്റെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരുപാട് NLP ജോലികളിലേക്ക്. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്ന പലതും കു അതുകൊണ്ടും, നമുക്ക് കോണ്\u200dക്രീറ്റ് തെളിവുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നു... ചില ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയാണ് ഫോട്ട്ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ബെ', 'mt': "Rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwali mħarrġa minn qabel wasslu għal titjib drammatiku fil-prestazzjoni fuq firxa ta’ kompiti downstream. Tali titjib fil-prestazzjoni motiva lir-riċerkaturi biex jikkwantifikaw u jifhmu l-informazzjoni lingwistika kkodifikata f’dawn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet. In general, researchers quantify the amount of linguistic information through probing, an endeavor which consists of training a supervised model to predict a linguistic property directly from the contextual representations.  Sfortunatament, din id-definizzjoni ta’ sondaġġ kienet soġġetta għal kritika estensiva fil-letteratura, u ġiet osservata li twassal għal riżultati paradossali u kontro-intwittivi. Fil-parti teoretika ta’ dan id-dokument, a ħna nieħdu l-pożizzjoni li l-għan tas-sondaġġ għandu jkun li jitkejjel l-ammont ta’ preġudizzju induttiv li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet jikkodifikaw fuq kompitu speċifiku. Aħna niddeskrivu wkoll qafas Bajesjan li jopera dan l-għan u jippermettilna nkwantifikaw il-preġudizzju induttiv tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet. Fil-parti empirika tad-dokument, a ħna napplikaw il-qafas tagħna għal varjetà ta’ kompiti NLP. Ir-riżultati tagħna jissuġġerixxu li l-qafas propost tagħna jtaffi ħafna problemi preċedenti li nstabu fis-sondaġġ. Barra minn hekk, nistgħu noffru evidenza konkreta li -- għal xi kompiti -- fast Text jista' joffri preġudizzju induttiv a ħjar mill-BERT.", 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone reprezentacje kontekstowe doprowadziły do dramatycznej poprawy wydajności w szeregu dalszych zadań. Takie poprawy wydajności zmotywowały naukowców do ilościowego określenia i zrozumienia informacji językowych zakodowanych w tych reprezentacjach. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, naukowcy ilościowo określają ilość informacji językowych poprzez sondowanie, przedsięwzięcie polegające na szkoleniu nadzorowanego modelu w celu przewidywania właściwości językowej bezpośrednio z kontekstowych reprezentacji. Niestety ta definicja sondowania była przedmiotem szerokiej krytyki w literaturze i zaobserwowano, że prowadzi do paradoksalnych i kontrintuicyjnych rezultatów. W teoretycznej części niniejszego artykułu zajmujemy stanowisko, że celem sondowania powinno być pomiar wielkości indukcyjnej stronniczości, którą reprezentacje kodują w konkretnym zadaniu. Ponadto opisujemy Bayesowskie ramy, które operacjonalizują ten cel i pozwalają nam ilościowo określić indukcyjną stronniczość reprezentacji. W części empirycznej artykułu stosujemy nasze ramy do różnych zadań NLP. Nasze wyniki sugerują, że proponowane ramy łagodzą wiele wcześniejszych problemów znalezionych w sondowaniu. Ponadto, jesteśmy w stanie zaoferować konkretne dowody na to, że--dla niektórych zadań--fastText może zaoferować lepszą indukcyjną stronniczość niż BERT.', 'no': 'Førehandsvis kontekstære representasjonar har ført til dramatiske forbedringar av utviklingar i eit rekkjefølgje av nedstrekkoppgåver. Desse forbedringane av utviklinga har motivert forskere til å kvantifisere og forstå den lingviske informasjonen koda i desse representasjonane. Generelt er forskere kvantifisert kor mange lingviske informasjon gjennom forsøk, eit forsøk som inneheld av trening av eit oversikt modell for å foregå ein lingvisk eigenskap direkte frå kontekstlege representasjonar. Dessverre har denne definisjonen av probasjon blitt subject til utvida kritikasjon i literaturet, og har blitt observert for å føre til paradoksiske og kontraintuitive resultat. I den teoretiske delen av denne papiret tar vi posisjonen som målet for å prøve må måle kor mykje induktive formasjonar representasjonane koder på eit spesifikke oppgåve. Vi beskriver meir ein Bayesiansk rammeverk som operasjonarer dette målet og tillater oss å kvantifisera utsjånaden av representasjonane. I den empiriske delen av papiret bruker vi rammeverket vårt på ulike NLP-oppgåver. Resultatet våre tyder på at vårt foreslått rammeverk gjer mange førre problemar som er funne i probasjonen. I tillegg kan vi tilbygge konkrete bevis at -- for nokre oppgåver -- fastText kan tilbygge ein betre induktiv forvirkning enn BERT.', 'mn': 'Өмнө сургалтын туршлагын үзүүлэлт нь олон давхар үйл ажиллагаанд гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулсан. Ийм үйл ажиллагааны сайжруулалт нь судлаачид эдгээр үзүүлэлттэй дүрслэгдсэн хэлний мэдээллийг тооцоолж, ойлгохын тулд урам зориулсан. Ингээд судлаачид хэлний мэдээллийн хэмжээг судалгаагаар хэмжээгээр тодорхойлдог. Энэ нь дамжуулагдсан загварын сургалтын загвар юм. Харамсалтай нь, энэ судалгааны тодорхойлолт уран зохиолынхаа маш их шаардлагатай болсон. Энэ нь парадоксийн, эсрэг үзэлтэй үр дүнд хүргэсэн. Энэ цаасын теоретикийн хэсэгт бид судалгааны зорилго нь тодорхой ажил дээр дүрслэгдэх үйлдвэрлэлийн зан чанарын хэмжээг хэмжих хэрэгтэй байрлал авдаг. Бид бас энэ зорилго ашиглаж буй Бейзийн хэмжээсүүдийг тайлбарлаж, харилцааны үйлдвэрлэлтийг тооцоолж чадна. Цагийн эзэмшигийн хэсэгт бид өөрсдийгөө олон NLP ажил дээр хэрэглэдэг. Манай үр дүнд бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн хэмжээсүүд судалгаанд олон асуудлуудыг багасгаж байна. Дараа нь, бид зарим ажил дээр тодорхой баталгаа өгч чадна---FastText нь BERT-аас илүү сайхан сэтгэл хөдлөл өгч чадна.', 'ro': 'Reprezentările contextuale pre-instruite au dus la îmbunătățiri dramatice ale performanței pe o serie de sarcini din aval. Astfel de îmbunătățiri ale performanței au motivat cercetătorii să cuantifice și să înțeleagă informațiile lingvistice codificate în aceste reprezentări. În general, cercetătorii cuantifică cantitatea de informații lingvistice prin sondare, un efort care constă în formarea unui model supravegheat pentru a prezice o proprietate lingvistică direct din reprezentările contextuale. Din păcate, această definiție a sondării a fost supusă unei critici extinse în literatură și s-a observat că duce la rezultate paradoxale și contraintuitive. În partea teoretică a acestei lucrări, luăm poziția că scopul sondării ar trebui să fie măsurarea cantității de distorsiuni inductive pe care reprezentările o codează pe o anumită sarcină. Mai departe descriem un cadru bayesian care operaționalizează acest obiectiv și ne permite să cuantificăm părtinirea inductivă a reprezentărilor. În partea empirică a lucrării, aplicăm cadrul nostru la o varietate de sarcini PNL. Rezultatele noastre sugerează că cadrul nostru propus atenuează multe probleme anterioare găsite în sondare. Mai mult decât atât, suntem capabili să oferim dovezi concrete că---pentru unele sarcini---fastText poate oferi o polarizare inductivă mai bună decât BERT.', 'sr': 'Preobučene kontekstske predstave dovele su do dramatičnih poboljšanja učinka u nizu zadataka. Takve poboljšanje učinka motiviralo su istraživače da kvantificiraju i razumeju jezičke informacije kodirane u tim predstavljanjima. Uglavnom, istraživači kvantificiraju količinu jezičkih informacija kroz probu, pokušaj koji se sastoji od obuke nadzornog model a da predvidi jezičku imovinu direktno iz kontekstualnih predstavljanja. Nažalost, ova definicija istraživanja je podložena širom kritike u književnosti, i promatrana je kako bi dovela do paradoksnih i kontraintuitivnih rezultata. U teorijskom dijelu ovog papira shvatamo poziciju da bi cilj probe trebalo da mjeri količinu induktivnih predrasuda koje predstavljanja kodiraju na određenom zadatku. Dalje opisujemo Bayesijski okvir koji operacioniše ovaj cilj i omogućava nam da kvantificiramo induktivne predrasude predstavljanja. U empiričkom dijelu papira, primjenjujemo naš okvir na razne NLP zadatke. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da naš predloženi okvir smanjuje mnoge prethodne probleme koje su pronađene u istraživanju. Osim toga, možemo ponuditi konkretne dokaze da, za neke zadatke, FastText može ponuditi bolju induktivnu predrasude nego BERT.', 'sv': 'Förutbildade kontextuella representationer har lett till dramatiska prestandaförbättringar på en rad nedströmsuppgifter. Sådana prestandaförbättringar har motiverat forskare att kvantifiera och förstå den språkliga information som kodas i dessa representationer. Generellt kvantifierar forskarna mängden språklig information genom sondering, en strävan som består av att utbilda en övervakad modell för att förutsäga en språklig egenskap direkt från kontextuella representationer. Tyvärr har denna definition av sondering utsatts för omfattande kritik i litteraturen och har observerats leda till paradoxala och kontraintuitiva resultat. I den teoretiska delen av denna uppsats tar vi ståndpunkten att målet med sondering borde vara att mäta mängden induktiv bias som representationerna kodar på en specifik uppgift. Vi beskriver vidare ett bayesiskt ramverk som operativiserar detta mål och låter oss kvantifiera representationernas induktiva bias. I den empiriska delen av uppsatsen tillämpar vi vårt ramverk på en mängd olika NLP-uppgifter. Våra resultat tyder på att vårt föreslagna ramverk lindrar många tidigare problem som upptäckts i sondering. Dessutom kan vi erbjuda konkreta bevis för att---för vissa uppgifter---fastText kan erbjuda en bättre induktiv bias än BERT.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති වැඩේ විශ්වාස කරන් ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා පරීක්ෂකයන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්නය කරන්න, භාෂාවික තො සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, පරීක්ෂකයෝ භාෂාවික තොරතුරු ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරනවා පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා භාෂා අවාසනාවන්තයෙන්, මේ විශ්වාසයේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාසය ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරලා ඉන්නේ  මේ පත්තරේ සාධාර්ථික කොටසේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අරමුණ වෙන්න ඕනේ කියලා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ කාර්යයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ක අපි තවදුරටත් බේසියාන් සංකේතයක් විස්තර කරනවා මේ අරමුණ වැඩකරනවා ඒ වගේම අපිට ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණාත්මක සංකේතය පත්තරේ ඉම්පිරිකාරික කොටසේ අපි අපේ පත්තරය NLP විවිධ වැඩකට ඇතුලත් කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරිස තවත්, අපිට පුළුවන් විශේෂ සාක්ෂියක් දෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා---වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්---FastText පුළුවන් BERT වඩා හොඳ', 'so': 'Pre-trained contextual representations have led to dramatic performance improvements on a range of downstream tasks.  Horumarinta shaqada ee caynkaas ah waxaa lagu hagaajiyaa baaritaanka si ay u qiyaasaan oo ay u fahamaan macluumaadka luuqadda ee ku qoran qaabilsan. Inta badan baaritaanka ayaa qiimeeya macluumaadka luuqadda lagu qorayo si toos ah looga sii sheego hantida luuqadda. Nasiib xumaatooyinkan baaritaanka waxaa la hoos dhigay qiimeynta aad u weyn ee warqada lagu qoray, waxaana la arkay inay sababto arimaha paradoksiga iyo ka geesta ah. Qaybta cilmiga ah ee warqaddan, waxaynu qaadannaa meeshii ay leedahay in la tijaabiyo ay tahay in la qiyaaso tirada baahida dhaqaalaha shaqaalaha ay ku qoran yihiin shaqo gaar ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu qoraynaa qoraal baabuur Bayesian ah oo qabanqaabinaya goalkan, waxaynu na ogolaannaynaa in aynu qiyaasno baahida dhaqaalaha shaqaalaha. Qaybta ku saabsan warqadda, waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa firaaqadeena oo ah shaqaalaha NLP oo kala duduwan. Abaalkayaga waxaa ka jeedinaya in dhaqdhaqaalahayaga la soo jeeday uu fududeeyo dhibaatooyin badan oo hore oo la soo caddeeyey. Sidoo kale waxaynu awoodi karnaa inaannu bixinayno caddeynta hubaal, in shuqullada qaarkood--', 'ta': 'Pre-trained contextual representations have led to dramatic performance improvements on a range of downstream tasks.  இவ்வாறு செயல்பாட்டு முன்னேற்றங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்களுக்கு ஆராய்ந்துள்ளது இந்த குறிப்பிட்ட மொழியில் க பொதுவாக, ஆராய்ச்சிகள் சோதிக்கும் மொழியில் தகவல் அளவை குறிப்பிடுகிறார்கள். இது ஒரு முயற்சி உள்ளது, நேரடியாக ஒரு மொழிப்பாட்டில் இருந்து நேரடிய துரதிர்ஷ்டவசமாக, இந்த வரையறையின் குறிப்பு எழுத்தாக்கத்தில் நிராகரிப்பு ஏற்பட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் அடர்த்திய முடிவுகளை கொண்டு வருவது ப இந்த காகிதத்தின் தலைப்பு பகுதியில், நாம் சோதிக்கும் நிலையை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறோம் செயல்படுத்தும் பிரச்சனைகள் குறிப்பிட்ட பணியி நாம் மேலும் ஒரு பேயீசியன் சட்டத்தை விவரிக்கிறோம் இந்த இலக்கை செயல்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் பிரதிநிதிகளின் செயல்பாட்டு ப காகிதத்தின் முக்கியமான பகுதியில், நாம் எங்கள் சட்டத்தை செயல்படுத்தி பல்வேறு NLP பணிகளுக்கு. எங்கள் முடிவுகள் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்ட சட்டத்தில் முந்தைய பிரச்சனைகளை நீக்குகிறது. மேலும், நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட தெளிவான அத்தாட்சிகளை வழங்க முடியும் - - சில பணிகளுக்கு -- வேகமான உரை பெர்ட் விட சிறந்த த தொழ', 'ur': 'پہلے تدریس کی کنٹکسٹیسٹ کی نمایش نے ڈراماٹ کارس کی طرح بہترین عملکرد کی۔ اس طرح کی فعالیت کی تحقیقات نے تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو ان کی تصدیق کرنے اور سمجھانے کی زبان شناسی معلومات کا ذریعہ پیدا کیا ہے۔ عمومی طور پر، تحقیقات کے ذریعے تحقیقات کے ذریعے تحقیق کرنے والے زبان شناسی معلومات کی تعداد کررہے ہیں، ایک تلاش جو ایک تحقیق کی مدل کی تعلیم کرتی ہے کہ ایک زبان شناسی اموال کو مستقیماً متوجہ نمونات سے پیش بینی کرے۔ بدبختی، یہ تحقیق کی تعریف ادبیات میں بہت زیادہ منکر ہے، اور پارادوکسیل اور مخالفت نتیجے کی وجہ سے نظر کیا گیا ہے. اس کاغذ کی نظریہ حصہ میں ہم اس موقعیت کو قبول کرتے ہیں جس کا موقعہ تحقیق کے ذریعہ ایک خاص کام پر قائم ہونا چاہیے۔ ہم ایک ایسی باتیزین فرمیک کا مفصل بیان کرتے ہیں جو اس موقع کو عملکرد کرتا ہے اور ہمیں نمونات کی اثبات کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے۔ کاغذ کے امپراتیک حصہ میں ہم اپنے فرمود کو NLP کے مختلف کاموں پر لازم کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے اس بات سے پیش آتے ہیں کہ ہمارے پیش آئے فرمود کی بہت سی پہلے مشکلات کو تحقیق میں کم کر دیتا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم صریح دلیل پیش کرنے کے قادر ہیں کہ---کچھ کاموں کے لئے---fastText BERT سے بہتر اچھی اچھی اثبات پیش کرسکتا ہے.', 'uz': "Pre-trained contextual representations have led to dramatic performance improvements on a range of downstream tasks.  Bu amalning o'zgarishlarini o'qituvchilarga o'qituvchilarga o'rganish va bu tashkilotlarda qo'shilgan tillar haqida o'rganish va o'rganishga hursand edi. Umumiy o'qituvchilar tilni tahrirlash orqali o'rganish orqali o'qituvchilar qiymatini aniqlaydi. Bu bir jarayon, bu tilni taʼminlovchi modelni o'rganish uchun bir xil xossasini butunlay qo'shish uchun o'rganish. Afsuski, bu tizimni o'rganish haqida juda katta qiymatga ega bo'lgan va u paradoksikal va anti-intuitiv natijalariga sabab ko'rdi. Bu qogʻozning teoretikal qismida, biz tashkilotni olib tashlash kerak, tashkilotlarning xususiyatlar vazifa bilan kodlash kerak. Biz bu maqolani amalga oshirish va bizni tasavvur qilishga ruxsat beramiz. Qogʻozning tashkilotlarida, bizning frameimizni boshqa NLP vazifalarini qo'llamiz. Bizning natijalarimiz talab qilayotgan freymiz oldingi muammolarni tekshirish uchun ko'p muammolarni o'chirib chiqaradi. Ko'rib, biz bir necha vazifalar uchun - fast Text BERT'dan yaxshi ishlaydi.", 'vi': 'Những biểu hiện ngữ ngữ trước đã được đào tạo đã dẫn đến hiệu quả kịch tính cải tiến trong một loạt các công việc xuôi dòng. Sự cải tiến tiến trình này đã thúc đẩy các nhà nghiên cứu đo lượng và hiểu được thông tin ngôn ngữ được mã hóa trong các đài phát biểu. Nói chung, các nhà nghiên cứu định lượng thông tin ngôn ngữ bằng cách thăm dò, một nỗ lực bao gồm việc huấn luyện một mô hình giám sát để dự đoán tài sản ngôn ngữ trực tiếp từ các biểu hiện liên tiếp. Đáng tiếc, định nghĩa thăm dò này đã bị nhiều người phê bình trong văn học, và đã được quan sát để dẫn đến những kết quả ngược lại và ngược ý nghĩa. Trong phần lý thuyết của tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có vị trí rằng mục tiêu tìm kiếm là đo lượng lệch lạc tự nhiên mà các biểu tượng mã hóa vào một nhiệm vụ cụ thể. Chúng tôi còn mô tả một cơ sở người Bayisian làm điều chỉnh mục tiêu này và cho phép chúng tôi đo định giới tính tự nhiên của các biểu tượng. Trong phần kinh nghiệm của tờ giấy, chúng tôi áp dụng cơ sở của chúng tôi vào nhiều công việc. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy những điều chúng tôi đã đề nghị giải quyết nhiều vấn đề trước đây. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi có thể đưa ra bằng chứng cụ thể... cho một số nhiệm vụ... nhanh có thể gây thiên vị dẫn đầu tốt hơn BERT.', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените контекстуални представяния доведоха до драматични подобрения в ефективността на редица задачи надолу по веригата. Подобни подобрения на ефективността са мотивирали изследователите да количествено определят и разбират езиковата информация, кодирана в тези представи. Като цяло изследователите количествено определят количеството лингвистична информация чрез сондиране, усилие, което се състои в обучение на контролиран модел за предсказване на лингвистично свойство директно от контекстуалните представи. За съжаление, това определение за сондиране е обект на широка критика в литературата и е наблюдавано да води до парадоксални и контраинтуитивни резултати. В теоретичната част на тази статия ние заемаме позицията, че целта на сондирането трябва да бъде измерването на количеството индуктивно отклонение, което представянията кодират за конкретна задача. По-нататък описваме байезийска рамка, която оперира тази цел и ни позволява количествено да определим индуктивното отклонение на представителствата. В емпиричната част на доклада ние прилагаме нашата рамка към различни задачи на НЛО. Нашите резултати предполагат, че предложената ни рамка облекчава много предишни проблеми, открити при сондирането. Освен това, ние сме в състояние да предложим конкретни доказателства, че за някои задачи може да предложи по-добра индуктивна отклонение от BERT.', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide contextuele representaties hebben geleid tot dramatische prestatieverbeteringen bij een reeks downstreamtaken. Dergelijke prestatieverbeteringen hebben onderzoekers gemotiveerd om de taalkundige informatie die in deze representaties is gecodeerd, te kwantificeren en te begrijpen. Over het algemeen kwantificeren onderzoekers de hoeveelheid taalkundige informatie door middel van soning, een inspanning die bestaat uit het trainen van een begeleid model om een linguïstische eigenschap rechtstreeks vanuit de contextuele representaties te voorspellen. Helaas is deze definitie van sonderen onderworpen aan uitgebreide kritiek in de literatuur en is waargenomen dat ze leidt tot paradoxale en contra-intuïtieve resultaten. In het theoretische deel van dit artikel nemen we het standpunt in dat het doel van het sonderen zou moeten zijn de hoeveelheid inductieve bias te meten die de representaties coderen op een specifieke taak. We beschrijven verder een Bayesiaans raamwerk dat dit doel operationaliseert en ons toelaat om de inductieve bias van de representaties te kwantificeren. In het empirische deel van de paper passen we ons raamwerk toe op verschillende NLP-taken. Onze resultaten suggereren dat ons voorgestelde kader veel eerdere problemen bij het onderzoeken verlicht. Bovendien zijn we in staat om concreet bewijs te leveren dat--voor sommige taken--fastText een betere inductieve bias kan bieden dan BERT.', 'da': 'Forududdannede kontekstuelle repræsentationer har ført til dramatiske forbedringer af ydeevnen på en række downstream-opgaver. Sådanne præstationsforbedringer har motiveret forskere til at kvantificere og forstå den sproglige information, der er kodet i disse repræsentationer. Generelt kvantificerer forskerne mængden af sproglig information gennem sonding, en bestræbelse, der består i at træne en overvåget model til at forudsige en sproglig egenskab direkte fra de kontekstuelle repræsentationer. Desværre har denne definition af sonding været genstand for omfattende kritik i litteraturen og er blevet observeret at føre til paradoksale og kontraintuitive resultater. I den teoretiske del af denne artikel tager vi den holdning, at målet med sonding burde være at måle mængden af induktiv bias, som repræsentationerne koder på en bestemt opgave. Vi beskriver yderligere en Bayesian ramme, der operationealiserer dette mål og giver os mulighed for at kvantificere repræsentationernes induktive bias. I den empiriske del af artiklen anvender vi vores rammer til en række NLP-opgaver. Vores resultater tyder på, at vores foreslåede rammebestemmelser afhjælper mange tidligere problemer fundet i sonding. Desuden er vi i stand til at tilbyde konkrete beviser for, at---for nogle opgaver---fastText kan tilbyde en bedre induktiv bias end BERT.', 'hr': 'Preobučene kontekstske predstave dovele su do dramatičnih poboljšanja učinka u nizu zadataka. Takve poboljšanje učinka motiviralo su istraživače kvantificirati i razumijeti jezičke informacije kodirane u tim predstavljanjima. Uglavnom, istraživači kvantificiraju količinu jezičkih informacija ispitivanjem, pokušaj koji se sastoji od obuke nadzornog model a kako bi predvidjeli jezičku imovinu direktno iz kontekstualnih predstavljanja. Nažalost, ova definicija ispitivanja je podložena širom kritike u književnosti, te je promatrana kako bi dovelo do paradoksnih i kontraintuitivnih rezultata. U teorijskom dijelu ovog papira uzimamo poziciju da cilj istrage treba mjeriti količinu induktivnih pristrasnosti koje predstavljanja kodiraju na određenom zadatku. Dalje opisujemo Bayesijski okvir koji operativira ovaj cilj i omogućava nam kvantificirati induktivnu pristrasnost predstavljanja. U empiričkom dijelu papira primjenjujemo naš okvir na razne zadatke NLP-a. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da naš predloženi okvir smanjuje mnoge prethodne probleme pronađene u istraživanju. Osim toga, možemo ponuditi konkretne dokaze da -- za neke zadatke -- FastText može ponuditi bolju induktivnu pristrasnost nego BERT.', 'de': 'Vortrainierte kontextbezogene Darstellungen haben zu dramatischen Leistungsverbesserungen bei einer Reihe nachgelagerter Aufgaben geführt. Solche Leistungsverbesserungen haben Forscher motiviert, die in diesen Darstellungen kodierten sprachlichen Informationen zu quantifizieren und zu verstehen. Im Allgemeinen quantifizieren Forscher die Menge an linguistischen Informationen durch Sondierung, ein Bestreben, ein überwachtes Modell zu trainieren, um eine linguistische Eigenschaft direkt aus den kontextuellen Repräsentationen vorherzusagen. Leider ist diese Definition von Sondierung in der Literatur Gegenstand umfangreicher Kritik und hat zu paradoxen und kontraintuitiven Ergebnissen geführt. Im theoretischen Teil dieser Arbeit nehmen wir die Position ein, dass das Ziel der Sondierung darin bestehen sollte, die Menge der induktiven Verzerrung zu messen, die die Repräsentationen für eine bestimmte Aufgabe kodieren. Wir beschreiben weiter ein Bayesisches Framework, das dieses Ziel operationalisiert und es uns ermöglicht, den induktiven Bias der Repräsentationen zu quantifizieren. Im empirischen Teil der Arbeit wenden wir unser Framework auf eine Vielzahl von NLP-Aufgaben an. Unsere Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass unser vorgeschlagener Rahmen viele frühere Probleme bei der Sondierung lindert. Darüber hinaus sind wir in der Lage, konkrete Beweise dafür zu liefern, dass fastText – für einige Aufgaben – einen besseren induktiven Bias bieten kann als BERT.', 'id': 'Perwakilan kontekstual yang dilatih-dilatih telah menyebabkan penambahan prestasi dramatis dalam jangkauan tugas turun. Perbaikan prestasi seperti ini telah mendorong para peneliti untuk mengkwantifikasikan dan memahami informasi bahasa yang dikodeksi dalam represisi ini. Secara umum, para peneliti mengumpulkan jumlah informasi bahasa melalui penyelidikan, usaha yang terdiri dari melatih model yang diawasi untuk memprediksi properti bahasa langsung dari representation kontekstual. Sayangnya, definisi penyelidikan ini telah mengalami kritika ekstensif dalam literatur, dan telah diperhatikan untuk memimpin ke hasil paradoksal dan kontro-intuitif. Dalam bagian teori kertas ini, kita mengambil posisi bahwa tujuan penyelidikan seharusnya mengukur jumlah bias induktif yang represensi mengkode pada tugas spesifik. Kami lebih lanjut menggambarkan rangkaian Bayesia yang memoperasikan tujuan ini dan memungkinkan kita mengurangi bias induktif represisi. Dalam bagian empirik kertas, kami menerapkan rangkaian kami untuk berbagai tugas NLP. Hasil kami menyarankan bahwa cadangan kami yang diusulkan mengurangi banyak masalah sebelumnya yang ditemukan dalam penyelidikan. Selain itu, kita dapat menawarkan bukti konkret bahwa---untuk beberapa tugas---FasText dapat menawarkan bias induktif yang lebih baik dari BERT.', 'ko': '사전 교육을 받은 상하문 표현법은 이미 일련의 하류 임무에서 현저한 성능 개선을 가져왔다.이러한 성능 개선은 연구원들이 이러한 표징에서 인코딩된 언어 정보를 양적으로 이해하고 이해하도록 한다.일반적으로 연구원들은 양적 언어 정보의 수량을 탐색함으로써 이 작업은 감독 모델을 훈련시켜 언어 환경 표징에서 언어 속성을 직접 예측하는 것을 포함한다.불행하게도 이러한 탐색의 정의는 문헌에서 광범위한 비판을 받았고, 자가당착과 직감에 어긋나는 결과를 초래할 수 있다는 관찰을 받았다.본고의 이론 부분에서 우리의 입장은 탐측의 목표는 표징이 특정 임무에서 인코딩된 귀납 편차량을 측정하는 것이어야 한다는 것이다.우리는 베일스의 틀을 한층 더 묘사했다. 이 틀은 이 목표를 실현했고, 표징의 귀납적 편차를 양적으로 허용했다.본고의 실증 부분에서 우리는 우리의 구조를 각종 NLP 임무에 응용할 것이다.우리의 결과는 우리가 제시한 틀이 이전에 탐색에서 발견한 많은 문제점을 완화시켰다는 것을 보여준다.그 밖에 우리는 어떤 임무에서 빠른 텍스트가 버트보다 더 좋은 귀납적 편견을 제공할 수 있다는 구체적인 증거를 제공할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Maandamano yaliyojifunza yalisababisha maboresho ya utendaji mkubwa katika kazi nyingi za mito ya chini. Maboresho ya utendaji huu yamewamasisha watafiti kuhakikisha na kuelewa taarifa za lugha zilizowekwa katika uwakilishi huu. Kwa ujumla, watafiti wanakadiria kiasi cha taarifa za lugha kupitia kujaribu, juhudi ambalo linajumuisha mafunzo ya modeli iliyothibitiwa kutabiri mali ya lugha moja kwa moja kutoka kwa uwakilishi wa sasa. Kwa bahati mbaya, ufafanuzi huu wa kuthibitisha umekuwa ukiukosoaji mkubwa katika fasihi hii, na umeonekana kuongoza matokeo yanayotokana na hali mbaya na yanayopinga ukweli. Katika sehemu ya nadharia ya gazeti hili, tunachukua nafasi kwamba lengo la kuchunguza lazima ni kupunguza kiasi cha upendeleo wa viwanda ambacho uwakilishi hujumuisha katika kazi fulani. Tunaelezea zaidi mfumo wa Bayesia unaoendelea lengo hili na tunaruhusu kutusahihisha upendeleo wa viwanda wa uwakilishi. Katika sehemu ya makaratasi, tunatumia mfumo wetu katika kazi mbalimbali za NLP. Matokeo yetu yanapendekeza kwamba mfumo wetu unapunguza matatizo mengi yaliyopita katika kuchunguza. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaweza kutoa ushahidi maalum kwamba ---- kwa baadhi ya kazi ---fast Text anaweza kutoa upendeleo mzuri zaidi wa viwanda kuliko BERT.', 'sq': 'Përfaqësitë kontekstuale të paratrajnuara kanë çuar në përmirësime dramatike të performancës në një gamë detyrash të mëparshme. Përmirësimet e tilla të performancës kanë motivuar kërkuesit të cilësojnë dhe të kuptojnë informacionin gjuhësor të koduar në këto përfaqësime. In general, researchers quantify the amount of linguistic information through probing, an endeavor which consists of training a supervised model to predict a linguistic property directly from the contextual representations.  Fatkeqësisht, kjo përcaktimi i hetimit ka qenë subjekt i kritikës së gjerë në letërsinë dhe është vëzhguar të çojë në rezultate paradoksale dhe kundër intuitive. Në pjesën teorike të kësaj letre, ne marrim pozicionin se qëllimi i sondazhit duhet të jetë matja e sasisë së paragjykimit induktiv që përfaqësimet kodojnë në një detyrë të veçantë. Ne përshkruajmë më tej një kuadër Bayesian që funksionon këtë qëllim dhe na lejon të kuantifikojmë paragjykimin induktiv të përfaqësimeve. Në pjesën empirike të gazetës, ne aplikojmë kuadrin tonë në një shumicë detyrash NLP. Rezultatet tona sugjerojnë se kuadri ynë i propozuar lehtëson shumë probleme të mëparshme të gjetura në hetim. Përveç kësaj, ne jemi në gjendje të ofrojmë prova konkrete që -- për disa detyra -- FasText mund të ofrojë një paragjykim më të mirë induktiv se BERT.', 'am': 'ቀድሞ ተማሪ የሁለተኛ ተሟጋቾች የውይይት ስራዎችን በማድረግ ውጤት የሚያሳድጉ ናቸው፡፡ እንደዚህ የድምፅ አካባቢዎች ተማሪዎችን በቋንቋዊ መረጃዎችን ለማስተካከል እና ለማስተዋል አግኝተዋል፡፡ በጠቅላላ፣ አስተማሪዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋ መረጃዎችን በመሞከሩ የሚያስፈልጉት፣ የቋንቋው የግንኙነት ግንኙነትን አቅራቢያ ለመጠቀም የሚሞክሩት ሞዴል ነው፡፡ በጸሐፊው፣ ይህ ግለጽ በሐሳብሪካዊው ትርጓሜ የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት የtheoretical ክፍል፣ መልዕክቶች በተወሰነ ስራ ላይ የሚቆጠሩ የኢንተርናዊ ጥያቄዎችን ማሰናከል የሚገባውን ቦታ እናስባለን፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ የሚሠራውን የባያይሳ ፍሬማር እናሳውቃለን እና የፕሬዚዳንት ተሟጋቾችን ጥያቄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሕልመት ጉዳይ ክፍል፣ ፍሬማችንን ለNLP ስራ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ፍጥረታችን የተዘጋጀውን የፍሬም ፍሬማችን አስቀድሞ በመፈለግ ላይ ብዙ ችግር ያሳስላል፡፡ ደግሞም፣ ለአንዳንዶች ስራ - የጾም ጽሑፍ ከBERT ይልቅ የበለጠ የጥያቄ ጥያቄን ማቅረብ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստոնալ ներկայացումները հանգեցրել են նշանակալի բարելավման արտադրողության մի շարք հետագա խնդիրների համար: Այսպիսի բարելավումները խթանեցին հետազոտողներին քանակել և հասկանալ այս ներկայացումներում կոդավորված լեզվաբանական տեղեկատվությունը: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, հետազոտողները քանակությամբ գնահատում են լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացիայի քանակը հետազոտության միջոցով, մի փորձ, որը կազմված է վերահսկված մոդելի ուսուցանումից լեզվաբանական հատկություն կանխատեսելու համար, ուղղակի կոնտեք Unfortunately, this definition of probing has been subject to extensive criticism in the literature, and has been observed to lead to paradoxical and counter-intuitive results.  Այս թղթի տեսական մասում մենք մտածում ենք, որ ուսումնասիրելու նպատակը պետք է չափի ինդուկտիվ կողմնականության քանակը, որը ներկայացումները կոդավորում են որոշակի խնդրի վրա: Մենք նաև նկարագրում ենք Բեյեզիայի շրջանակը, որը օպերացիոնալացնում է այս նպատակը և թույլ է տալիս մեզ չափել ներկայացումների ինդուկտիվ կողմնականությունը: Թղթի էմպրիկական մասում մենք կիրառում ենք մեր շրջանակը ՆԼՊ-ի բազմաթիվ խնդիրների համար: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած շրջանակը նվազեցնում է նախորդ խնդիրները, որոնք հայտնաբերվել են ուսումնասիրելիս: Ավելին, մենք կարող ենք ներկայացնել կոնկրետ ապացույցներ, որ որոշ խնդիրների համար արագ տեքստը կարող է ավելի լավ ինդուկտիվ կողմնականություն ներկայացնել, քան BER-ը:', 'fa': 'نمایش\u200cهای موقعیت پیش آموزش پیش\u200cآموزش باعث افزایش عملکرد dramatic در مجموعه\u200cی کارهای پایین\u200cترین است. این بهترین عملکرد تحقیقات\u200cکننده\u200cها به محققات تعداد و درک اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی که در این نمایش\u200cها رمز شده\u200cاند انگیزه می\u200cکنند. در general, researchers quantify the amount of linguistic information through probation, an effort consisting of training a supervised model to predict a language property directly from the contextual representations. متاسفانه، این تعریف تحقیقات در ادبیات تحقیق زیادی شده و به نتیجه\u200cهای مخالف و مخالف بصیرت مشاهده شده است. در قسمت نظریه\u200cای از این کاغذ، ما موقعیت را می\u200cگیریم که هدف تحقیق باید مقدار تعداد پیشرفت\u200cهای تحقیق را اندازه گیری کند که نمایش\u200cدهندگان روی یک کار خاص پیدا می\u200cکنند. ما هم یک چهارچوب بایزی را توصیف می کنیم که این هدف را فعال می کند و اجازه می دهیم که چهارچوب تحریک نمایش را تعداد کنیم. در بخش امپراطوری کاغذ، ما چهارچوب خود را به کارهای مختلف NLP ارائه می دهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که چهارچوب پیشنهاد ما مشکلات پیشینیان را در امتحان کمتر می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، ما می توانیم مدرک دقیق را پیشنهاد کنیم که---برای بعضی وظیفه---FastText می تواند یک پیشنهاد بهتر از BERT را پیشنهاد دهد.', 'tr': "Öňki çalşyrylan metin suratlary indiki täzeliklerde dramatik täzelikleri gelişmelere sebep etdi. Böyle etkinlik gelişmeleri, bilim adamlarynyň bu ifadelerde kodlanýan lingwistiki maglumatyny tassyklamak ve çözmesine ruhlandyrdy. Adatça, araştırmacılar lingwistiki maglumatyň haýsysyny barlamak bilen tanyşdyrýarlar, bu sistemasy, lingwistiki häsiýeti görä görnüşdürmek üçin gözetlenýän nusgadyr. Gynansakda, bu synagyň definisyony edebiýatda örän uly kritiýa çykardy we paradoksik we netijesi üstüne getirilýär. Bu gazetin teoretik bölümünde, denemenin amacı belli bir göreve kodlanması gerektiğini düşünüyoruz. Biz bu hedefi etkinleştiren Bayezi bir çerçevesini tasvir edip, ifadelerin etkinleştirilmesine mümkün edebiliriz. Kagyzyň empirik böleginde, biz çerämizi NLP işleriniň birnäçe zadyna uygulaýarys. netijelerimiz teklip eden frameworkymyzyň probada tapylýan köp meseleleri azaltýandygyny maslahat berýärler. Mundan soňra biz özümize takyk kanlag berebiliriz---käbir zada üçin---fastTekst BERT'dan gowy täsirli bir sowgat teklip edip biler.", 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিভিন্ন কাজের উপর ন্যাট্রামিক প্রদর্শনের উন্নতি ঘটেছে। এই কার্যকলাপের উন্নতি গবেষকদের উদ্দেশ্য দিয়েছে যারা এই প্রতিনিধিত্বে লিখেছে ভাষাগত তথ্য পরিমাণ এবং বুঝতে পারে। সাধারণত গবেষকেরা ভাষার তথ্য পরিমাণ পরিমাণ পরিমাণ প্রমাণ করেছেন, যা একটি প্রচেষ্টার মধ্যে রয়েছে ভাষাগত সম্পত্তি দ্বারা সরাসরি প্রতিনিধিত্বের কাছ থে দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, এই পরীক্ষার বিষয়টি সাহিত্যে বিস্তারিত সমালোচনার মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে এবং তাকে দেখা গেছে প্যারাডক্সিক এবং বির এই কাগজটির তত্ত্বিক অংশে আমরা এই অবস্থান নিয়ে যাচ্ছি যে পরীক্ষা করার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ক্রিয়াকর্মীদের পরিমাপ মাপ করা উচিত যে প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রত আমরা আরো একটি বেয়েশিয়ান ফ্রেম বর্ণনা করি যা এই লক্ষ্যটি কার্যকর কর করে এবং প্রতিনিধিদের প্রতিনিধিদের ক্ষেত্রীয় বিভিন্ন বিষয় পর কাগজের প্রাকৃতিক অংশে আমরা এনএলপির বিভিন্ন কাজে আমাদের ফ্রেম কাঠামো প্রয়োগ করি। আমাদের ফলাফল পরামর্শ দেয় যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফ্রেম কাঠামো প্রমাণ করার জন্য পূর্বের সমস্যাগুলোকে কমিয়ে দ এছাড়াও, আমরা কোন নির্দিষ্ট প্রমাণ প্রদান করতে পারি যে কিছু কাজের জন্য- ফোস্ট ট টেক্সট বিবেরেটের চেয়ে ভালো ক্রিয়েটিভ', 'af': "Voorsoekte contextual voorstellings het dramatiese prestasie verbeteringe op 'n reek van onderstreem opdragte gelei. Hierdie prestasie verbeteringe het gemotiveer ondersoekers om die lingwisiese inligting in hierdie voorstellings te quantifiseer en te verstaan. Algemeen, resekers quantifiseer die hoeveelheid lingwisiese inligting deur probeer, 'n versoek wat bestaan van die onderwerp van 'n onderwerp model om 'n lingwisiese eienskap direk te voorskou van die contextual verteenwoordings. Ongelukkig is hierdie definisie van probering onderwerp aan uitbreidige kritike in die literaat, en is aangesien om te lei na paradoksies en anti-intuitiewe resultate. In die teorieese deel van hierdie papier, neem ons die posisie wat die doel van probeer moet wees met die hoeveelheid van induktiewe bias wat die voorstellings kodeer op 'n spesifieke taak. Ons beskrywe verder 'n Bayesian raamwerk wat hierdie doel operatiseer en laat ons toe om die voorstellings se induktiewe voorspoedige te quantifiseer. In die empiriese deel van die papier, toewend ons raamwerk op 'n verskillende NLP taak. Ons resultate stel voorstel dat ons voorgestelde raamwerk baie vorige probleme wat in probeer gevind is, verminder. Ook, ons kan betekens bevestig aanbied dat--- vir sommige opdragte--- fastTeks kan 'n beter induktiewe bias aanbied as BERT.", 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş müxtəlif təhsil göstərilmələri, a şağı təhsil işlərində dramatik performans düzəltmələrinə yol göstərdilər. Bütün bu tədbirlərin düzəltmələri araştırmaların bu göstərişlərdə kodlanmış dil məlumatlarını quantifik və anlamağa məcbur etdi. Genel olaraq, araştırmacılar təminatı vasitəsilə dil bilgisayarının dəyişdirilməsini təmin edirlər. Bu, müxtəlif göstərilmələrdən doğrudan dil özelliğini təmin etmək üçün nəzarət edilmiş modellərdən olub. Necə olaraq, bu sınaqların tanımlaması literature içində böyük kritiklərə məxsus edildi və paradoksik və counter-intuitiv sonuçlarına sürüklənmək üçün baxıldı. Bu kağızın teoriqli bölümündə, proba məqsədilərinin müəyyən ediləcəyi tədbirlərin müəyyən bir işdə kodladığı tədbirlərin müəyyən edilməsi lazımdır. Biz bu məqsədini işlədən Beyziyalı framework ünü daha da tanımlıyıq və bizim təşkillərin təşkil etdikləri tərzlərini hesablamağa imkan veririk. Kağızın empirik parçasında, çeşitli NLP işinə çevirdik. Sonuçlarımız təbliğ etdiyimiz frameworklərimizin sonda bulunan çox əvvəlki problemləri azaldırır. Daha sonra, bəzi işlər üçün - fastText BERT-dən daha yaxşı təsirli təsirləri təbliğ edə bilər.', 'ca': "Pre-trained contextual representations have led to dramatic performance improvements on a range of downstream tasks.  Això ha motivat els investigadors a quantificar i entendre la informació lingüística codificada en aquestes representacions. En general, els investigadors quantifiquen la quantitat d'informació lingüística a través de l'investigació, un esforç que consisteix en formar un model supervisat per predir una propietat lingüística directament des de les representacions contextuals. Malauradament, aquesta definició d'investigació ha estat subjecta a crítiques extenses a la literatura i s'ha observat que ha portat a resultats paradoxals i contraintuïtius. En la part teòrica d'aquest paper, prenem la posició que l'objectiu de la sonda hauria de ser mesurar la quantitat de bias inductiu que les representacions codifiquen en una tasca específica. També descrivim un marc bayèsiu que funcionalitza aquest objectiu i ens permet quantificar el bias inductiu de les representacions. En la part empírica del paper, aplicam el nostre marc a una varietat de tasques del NLP. Els nostres resultats suggereixen que el nostre marc proposat alivia molts problemes anteriors trobat en l'investigació. A més, som capaços d'oferir proves concretes que, per algunes tasques, fast Text pot oferir un bias inductiu millor que BERT.", 'cs': 'Předškolené kontextové reprezentace vedly k dramatickému zlepšení výkonu řady následných úkolů. Tato zlepšení výkonnosti motivovala výzkumníky k kvantifikaci a porozumění jazykovým informacím zakódovaným v těchto reprezentacích. Obecně platí, že výzkumníci kvantifikují množství jazykových informací prostřednictvím sondování, což spočívá v tréninku dohledovaného modelu k předpovědi jazykové vlastnosti přímo z kontextových reprezentací. Bohužel tato definice sondování byla v literatuře předmětem rozsáhlé kritiky a bylo pozorováno, že vede k paradoxním a kontraintuitivním výsledkům. V teoretické části tohoto článku zaujímáme stanovisko, že cílem sondování by mělo být měření množství indukčního biasu, které reprezentace kódují na konkrétním úkolu. Dále popisujeme Bayesovský rámec, který tento cíl operationalizuje a umožňuje kvantifikovat indukční bias reprezentací. V empirické části příspěvku aplikujeme náš rámec na různé úlohy NLP. Naše výsledky naznačují, že náš navržený rámec zmírňuje mnoho předchozích problémů nalezených při sondování. Kromě toho jsme schopni nabídnout konkrétní důkazy, že---pro některé úkoly---fastText může nabídnout lepší indukční bias než BERT.', 'bs': 'Preobučene kontekstske predstave dovele su do dramatičnih poboljšanja učinka u nizu nizovih zadataka. Takve poboljšanje učinka motiviralo su istraživače da kvantificiraju i razumeju jezičke informacije kodirane u tim predstavljanjima. Uglavnom, istraživači kvantificiraju količinu jezičkih informacija putem ispitivanja, pokušaja koja se sastoji od obuke nadzornog model a kako bi predvidjela jezičku imovinu direktno iz kontekstualnih predstavljanja. Nažalost, ova definicija istraživanja je podložena širom kritike u književnosti, i bila je promatrana kako bi dovela do paradoksnih i kontraintuitivnih rezultata. U teorijskom dijelu ovog papira, uzimamo poziciju da cilj probe treba mjeriti količinu induktivnih pristrasnosti koje predstavljanja kodiraju na određenom zadatku. Dalje opisujemo Bayesijski okvir koji funkcioniše ovaj cilj i omogućava nam da kvantificiramo induktivne predrasude predstavljanja. U empiričkom dijelu papira primjenjujemo naš okvir na razne NLP zadatke. Naši rezultati sugeriraju da naš predloženi okvir smanjuje mnoge prethodne probleme pronađene u istraživanju. Osim toga, možemo ponuditi konkretne dokaze da za neke zadatke FastText može ponuditi bolju induktivnu predrasude nego BERT.', 'et': 'Eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstilised esitlused on toonud kaasa märkimisväärse tulemuslikkuse paranemise mitmetes järgnevates ülesannetes. Sellised tulemuslikkuse parandamised on motiveerinud teadlasi kvantifitseerima ja mõistma nendes esitustes kodeeritud keelelist teavet. Üldiselt mõõdavad teadlased keelelise teabe hulka proovimise kaudu, mis seisneb järelevalvemudeli koolitamises keelelise omaduse ennustamiseks otse kontekstuaalsetest esitustest. Kahjuks on seda proovimise definitsiooni kirjanduses laialdaselt kritiseeritud ning täheldatud, et see toob kaasa paradoksaalseid ja vastupidiseid tulemusi. Teoreetilises osas võtame seisukoha, et proovimise eesmärk peaks olema mõõta induktiivse kallutuse hulka, mida esindused kodeerivad konkreetse ülesande. Lisaks kirjeldame Bayesi raamistikku, mis operatsionaliseerib seda eesmärki ja võimaldab meil kvantifitseerida esituste induktiivset eelarvamust. Töö empiirilises osas rakendame oma raamistikku mitmesugustele NLP ülesannetele. Meie tulemused näitavad, et meie kavandatud raamistik leevendab paljusid varasemaid probleeme probleemide uurimisel. Lisaks on meil võimalik pakkuda konkreetseid tõendeid selle kohta, et mõne ülesande puhul võib---fastText pakkuda paremat induktiivset eelarvamust kui BERT.', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut asiayhteydelliset esitykset ovat johtaneet merkittäviin parannuksiin useissa jatko-vaiheen tehtävissä. Tällaiset suorituskyvyn parannukset ovat motivoineet tutkijoita kvantifioimaan ja ymmärtämään näissä esityksissä koodattua kielellistä tietoa. Yleensä tutkijat kvantifioivat kielellisen tiedon määrän luotaamalla, mikä koostuu ohjatun mallin kouluttamisesta ennustamaan kielellistä ominaisuutta suoraan kontekstuaalisista representaatioista. Valitettavasti tätä kartoituksen määritelmää on kritisoitu laajasti kirjallisuudessa, ja sen on havaittu johtavan paradoksaalisiin ja vastaintuitiivisiin tuloksiin. Teoreettisessa osuudessa otamme kannan, että luotauksen tavoitteena pitäisi olla mitata induktiivisen harhan määrää, jonka esitykset koodaavat tiettyyn tehtävään. Lisäksi kuvaamme bayesilaista viitekehystä, joka operationalisoi tämän tavoitteen ja antaa meille mahdollisuuden kvantifioida representaatioiden induktiivista harhaa. Työn empiirisessä osassa sovellamme viitekehystä erilaisiin NLP-tehtäviin. Tuloksemme viittaavat siihen, että ehdotettu viitekehys lievittää monia aikaisempia sondoinnissa havaittuja ongelmia. Lisäksi voimme tarjota konkreettista näyttöä siitä, että --- joidenkin tehtävien --- fastText voi tarjota paremman induktiivisen puolueellisuuden kuin BERT.', 'jv': 'representation Pengaturan kanggo langgar wigatinipun arno sak sabanjur-sabanjuré nggawe gerakan kelas karo sapa-sabanjuré informasi ingkang dipulangan barang iki. Jung-Jung, bahwa nambah kuwi nggawe informasi bangrung kuwi nggawe geraraning, kuwi wis nguasai nggawe model sing bisa nguasai perbudhakan kanggo urjane perusahaan anyar lengrungsik dadi nguasai sak cara-seneng kita nguasai perusahaan anyar Saiki, nglanggar, définisi apa winih kanggo ngilanggar deweke kapan mulasar tentang kanggo didasakno ning basa, lan iki dadi bisa nguasakno karo perusahaan karo perusahaan Genjer Awak dhéwé nglarahaan ngerasakno banget bayesi sing perusahaan mrogram iki lan tambah njaluké awak dhéwé nggawe barang kelompok tarjamahan surok tarjamahan Nambah sing empire karo paper, kita nguasai nggawe barang karo akeh operasi NLP Rejalekan dhéwé ngerasakno ngono nggawe layakno kanggo nyenggawe akeh perbudhakan kanggo nyengguna supoyo barang. Label, kéné iso ngebahno nggambar obah-obah lan ---fast-Text iso ngebahno bias sing luwih apik sing luwih apik BERT.', 'he': 'מייצגים קונטקסטיים מאומנים מראש הובילו לשיפורים דרמטיים ביצועים על מגוון של משימות מתקדמות. שיפור ביצועים כזה מוטיבציה חוקרים כדי לקוונטיב ולהבין את המידע השפתי מוצפן בתציגות אלה. In general, researchers quantify the amount of linguistic information through probing, an endeavor which consists of training a supervised model to predict a linguistic property directly from the contextual representations.  למרבה הצער, ההגדרה הזו של חקירה נחשבה לביקורה רחבה בספרות, ונצפה להוביל לתוצאות פרדוקסיות ונגדות אינטואיטיביות. בחלק התיאורי של הנייר הזה, אנו לוקחים את העמדה שהמטרה של חקירה צריכה להיות למדוד את כמות ההתמחות המדליקה שהמייצגות קודות על משימה מסוימת. אנחנו מתארים יותר מסגרת בייזית שמפעילה את המטרה הזאת ומאפשרת לנו לקוונטיב את ההתמחות האינדוקטיבית של הייצגות. בחלק האמפריקלי של הנייר, אנחנו משתמשים במסגרת שלנו למגוון של משימות NLP. Our results suggest that our proposed framework alleviates many previous problems found in probing.  חוץ מזה, אנחנו מסוגלים להציע ראיות konkretות ש---עבור כמה משימות---טקסט מהיר יכול להציע חיווך induktiv טוב יותר מברט.', 'sk': 'Vnaprej usposobljene kontekstualne predstavitve so pripeljale do dramatičnih izboljšav uspešnosti pri različnih nadaljnjih nalogah. Takšne izboljšave uspešnosti so spodbudile raziskovalce k kvantifikaciji in razumevanju jezikovnih informacij, kodiranih v teh predstavitvah. Na splošno raziskovalci kvantificirajo količino jezikovnih informacij skozi sondiranje, prizadevanje, ki je sestavljeno iz usposabljanja nadzorovanega modela za napovedovanje jezikovne lastnosti neposredno iz kontekstualnih reprezentacij. Na žalost je bila ta definicija sondiranja v literaturi podvržena obsežnim kritikam in opaženo je, da vodi do paradoksalnih in kontrainutitivnih rezultatov. V teoretičnem delu prispevka zavzemamo stališče, da bi moral biti cilj sondiranja merjenje količine induktivnih pristranskosti, ki jih reprezentacije kodirajo na določeni nalogi. Nadalje opisujemo bajzijski okvir, ki operacionalizalizira ta cilj in nam omogoča kvantificiranje induktivne pristranskosti reprezentacij. V empiričnem delu prispevka uporabljamo naš okvir za različne naloge NLP. Naši rezultati kažejo, da naš predlagani okvir ublaži številne prejšnje težave pri sondiranju. Poleg tega lahko ponudimo konkretne dokaze, da lahko --za nekatere naloge---fastText ponudi boljšo induktivno pristranskost kot BERT.', 'ha': "QScriptBreakpointsModel Haƙĩƙa, mafarinsa da wannan na aikin aiki sun yi kwaɗayin mutanen su ƙaddara, kuma su fahimta lãbãrin harshen da aka kodi cikin waɗannan. A jumla, watani na ƙayyade kimada na fassarar lãbãri cikin linguistic da aka jarraba, da aikin wanda ke ƙunsa da wani motel wanda aka tsare shi dõmin ya yi bayani ga dũkiyar linguistic ko da ɗabi'a daga shaidar masu husũma. Babu nasara, an sami wannan fassarar jarraba a cikin littafin na zargi, kuma an gane shi yana ƙara matsalar masu paradoksi da motsi-na'ura. Daga rabin takardan wannan, Munã ɗauki wurin da aka ƙayyade goani ga jarraba shi ne ya kamata a ƙaddara nau'in biyar masu saka da aka lokace da mazaunin aiki na ƙayyade. Tuna bayyana wani firam na Bayesian wanda ke tafiyar da wannan goan kuma yana yarda mu iya ƙayyade tamkar masu gabani. In a cikin rabin takarda, muna samun firam kanmu zuwa wasu aikin NLP. Matamayinmu na gaya cewa, firam da aka buƙata, yana sauƙaƙara masu yawa da aka samu a cikin jarraba. Za kuma, za mu iya iya bãyar da shaidar masu kamfata kuwa-----...ga wasu aikanni---...", 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་བསླབ་པའི་contextual representations་གིས་མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཚད་རྗེས་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འདི་དག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བར་ཡོད་པའི་སྐོར་ལས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ལ་གཏོང་མཁན་ཚོས་ཀྱང་དང་ཕལ་ཆེན སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་ཚད་རྩིས་གཏོང་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པའི་ངོས་འཛིན་འདི་ལ་རྩོམ་པ་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་དོན་ལྟར་བཀོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པའི་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེན་ཚད་ངེས འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཡིག་ཆའི་གྲངས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཅིག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཅན་གྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོའི་རྩིས་གཞིའི་ནང་དུ་NLP ལས་ཀ་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་ཅིག་ལ་ངོ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་མང་ཙམ་སྤྲོད་ཐུབ།'}
{'en': '', 'pt': 'Sondando a poda estruturada em modelos pré-treinados multilíngues: configurações, algoritmos e eficiência', 'es': 'Sondeo de la poda estructurada en modelos multilingües preentrenados: configuración, algoritmos y eficiencia', 'ar': 'فحص التقليم المنظم على نماذج متعددة اللغات مدربة مسبقًا: الإعدادات والخوارزميات والكفاءة', 'fr': "Analyse de l'élagage structuré sur des modèles pré-entraînés multilingues\xa0: paramètres, algorithmes et efficacité", 'zh': '于多言预练模形测结构化剪置、算法、效率', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल पर संरचित छंटाई की जांच: सेटिंग्स, एल्गोरिदम और दक्षता', 'ja': '事前に訓練された多言語モデルでの構造化された枝刈りのプローブ：設定、アルゴリズム、および効率性', 'ru': 'Зондирование структурной обрезки на многоязычных предварительно обученных моделях: настройки, алгоритмы и эффективность', 'ga': 'Bearradh Struchtúrtha a Scrúdú ar Mhúnlaí Réamhoilte Ilteangacha: Socruithe, Algartaim, agus Éifeachtúlacht', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური წინატრუქტირებული მოდელების სტრუქტურაცია: პარამეტრები, ალგორიტები და ეფექტურაცია', 'hu': 'Strukturált metszés vizsgálata többnyelvű, előképzett modelleken: beállítások, algoritmusok és hatékonyság', 'el': 'Δοκιμή δομημένου κλαδέματος σε πολύγλωσσα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα: Ρυθμίσεις, αλγόριθμοι και αποδοτικότητα', 'it': 'Analisi della potatura strutturata su modelli multilingui pre-addestrati: impostazioni, algoritmi ed efficienza', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілді алдын- ала оқылған үлгілерді тексеру: Баптаулар, алгоритмдер және эффективнік', 'lt': 'Struktūrinio traukimo keliomis kalbomis iš anksto parengtų modelių bandymas: nustatymai, algoritmai ir veiksmingumas', 'mk': 'Истражување на структурирани притисоци на повеќејазични предобучени модели: поставувања, алгоритми и ефикасност', 'ms': 'Mencoba Pengikatan Struktur pada Model Berbahasa Terlatih Berbahasa: Tetapan, Algoritma, dan Efisiensi', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷക്കാരുടെ മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d പ്രോക്ടിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം: സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d, അല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d, പ', 'mt': 'Probar tal-Ħruġ Strutturat fuq Mudelli Multilingwi mħarrġa minn qabel: Settijiet, Algoritmi, u Effiċjenza', 'mn': 'Олон хэлний өмнөх сургалтын загваруудын туршилтын төлөвлөгөө: Тохиргоо, Алгоритм, Үзэмшил', 'no': 'Prøver strukturerte prøving på fleirspråksprøve modeller: Innstillingar, algoritme og effektivitet', 'pl': 'Sondowanie strukturalnego przycinania na wielojęzycznych wstępnie przeszkolonych modelach: ustawienia, algorytmy i wydajność', 'ro': 'Projarea tăierii structurate pe modele multilingve Pre-instruite: setări, algoritmi și eficiență', 'sr': 'Proba strukturiranog pristupanja na višejezičkim predobučenim modelima: postavke, algoritme i učinkovitost', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: සැකසුම්, ඇල්ගෝරිතම්, සහ සක්\u200dරීය', 'sv': 'Undersökning av strukturerad beskärning på flerspråkiga Pre-utbildade modeller: Inställningar, algoritmer och effektivitet', 'so': 'Isticmaalidda la dhisay oo ku qoran luuqado badan oo hore-trained Models: Settings, Algorithms, and Efficiency', 'ta': 'பல மொழிகள் முன் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளில் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்ட முயற்சி செய்கிறது', 'ur': 'Multilingual Pre-trained Models پر پرینگ ساختہ پرونگ: Settings, Algorithms, and Efficiency', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dự án Tập trước nhiều ngôn ngữ: Thiết lập, Algorehms và hiệu quả', 'nl': 'Proberen van gestructureerd snoeien op meertalige voorgetrainde modellen: instellingen, algoritmes en efficiëntie', 'bg': 'Проучване на структурирано подрязване на многоезични предварително обучени модели: настройки, алгоритми и ефективност', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af struktureret beskæring på flersprogede præuddannede modeller: Indstillinger, algoritmer og effektivitet', 'hr': 'Proba strukturiranog pružanja o multijezičkim predobučenim modelima: postavke, algoritmi i učinkovitosti', 'de': 'Strukturiertes Beschneiden an mehrsprachigen vortrainierten Modellen: Einstellungen, Algorithmen und Effizienz', 'fa': 'تحقیقات مجموعه ساخته شده در مورد مدل های پیش آموزش چند زبان: تنظیمات، الگوریتمها و فعالیت', 'ko': '다중 언어 예비 훈련 모델의 구조화 편집 탐색: 설정, 알고리즘과 효율', 'id': 'Mencoba Pruning Struktur pada Model Berbahasa Terlatih Sebelumnya: Pengaturan, Algoritma, dan Efisiensi', 'sw': 'Mpango wa Mpango wa Utamaduni wa lugha za Kiingereza: Mpango, Algorithms, na ufanisi', 'af': 'Verprobeer Struktuurde Pruning op veelvuldige voorafgeleerde modele: Instellings, Algoritme en Effektiviteit', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Provoja e përpjekjeve të strukturuara mbi modelet shumëgjuhësore të stërvitura përpara: rregullime, algoritme dhe efektshmëri', 'hy': 'Տեղադրված փորձի փորձը բազլեզու նախապատրաստված մոդելների վրա. սահմանափակումներ, ալգորիթմներ և արդյունավետություն', 'az': '√áoxlu dill…ôrd…ôn …ôvv…ôl t…ôhsil edilmiŇü Modell…ôr bar…ôsind…ô Structured Pruning sńĪnamasńĪ: Ayarlar, Algoritl…ôr v…ô Efficiency', 'bs': 'Proba strukturiranog pristupanja na višejezičkim predobučenim modelima: postavke, algoritme i učinkovitost', 'bn': 'বহুভাষায় প্রশিক্ষিত পূর্ববর্তী মডেলগুলোতে প্রস্থাপন করা হচ্ছে: বৈশিষ্ট্য, অ্যালগরিদম এবং কার্যকলাপ', 'ca': 'Probar Pruning Estructurat en Models Multilingües Preentrenats: Configuracions, Algoritmes i Efficiencia', 'cs': 'Snímání strukturovaného řezání na vícejazyčných předškolených modelech: nastavení, algoritmy a efektivita', 'et': 'Struktureeritud oksamine mitmekeelsete eelkoolitud mudelitega: seaded, algoritmid ja tõhusus', 'fi': 'Strukturoidun oksan kartoittaminen monikielisissä esikoulutetuissa malleissa: asetukset, algoritmit ja tehokkuus', 'tr': 'Birnäçe diller öňünde eğlenmiş Modeller barada Structured Pruning Testing: Settings, Algorithms, and Efficiency', 'jv': 'Saingke structural Prouning on Multilanguage Previewed Modes: settings, Algorithms, and Efeffectness', 'sk': 'Prodiranje strukturiranega obrezovanja na večjezičnih vnaprej usposobljenih modelih: nastavitve, algoritmi in učinkovitost', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Probing Structured Pruning on Multilingual Pre-trained Models: Settings, Algorithms, and Efficiency', 'bo': 'Probing Structured Pruning on Multilingual Pre-trained Models: Settings, Algorithms, and Efficiency'}
{'en': 'Structured document understanding has attracted considerable attention and made significant progress recently, owing to its crucial role in intelligent document processing. However, most existing related models can only deal with the document data of specific language(s) (typically English) included in the pre-training collection, which is extremely limited. To address this issue, we propose a simple yet effective Language-independent Layout Transformer (LiLT) for structured document understanding. LiLT can be pre-trained on the structured documents of a single language and then directly fine-tuned on other languages with the corresponding off-the-shelf monolingual/multilingual pre-trained textual models. Experimental results on eight languages have shown that LiLT can achieve competitive or even superior performance on diverse widely-used downstream benchmarks, which enables language-independent benefit from the pre-training of document layout structure. Code and model are publicly available at https://github.com/jpWang/LiLT.', 'ar': 'تمت دراسة التقليم المنظم على نطاق واسع على نماذج اللغة أحادية اللغة المدربة مسبقًا ولا يزال يتعين تقييمها بشكل كامل على نظرائهم متعددي اللغات. يبحث هذا العمل في ثلاثة جوانب للتقليم المنظم على نماذج لغة متعددة اللغات مدربة مسبقًا: الإعدادات ، والخوارزميات ، والكفاءة. تظهر التجارب على تسع مهام متتالية عدة ظواهر غير بديهية: بالنسبة للإعدادات ، لا يؤدي التقليم الفردي لكل لغة إلى نتيجة أفضل ؛ بالنسبة للخوارزميات ، فإن أبسط طريقة تؤدي بشكل أفضل ؛ من أجل الكفاءة ، لا يعني النموذج السريع أنه صغير أيضًا. لتسهيل المقارنة على جميع مستويات التباين ، نقدم Dynamic Sparsification ، وهو نهج بسيط يسمح بتدريب النموذج مرة واحدة والتكيف مع أحجام النماذج المختلفة عند الاستدلال. نأمل أن يملأ هذا العمل الفجوة في دراسة التقليم المنظم على نماذج متعددة اللغات مدربة مسبقًا ويلقي الضوء على الأبحاث المستقبلية.', 'es': 'La poda estructurada se ha estudiado ampliamente en modelos lingüísticos monolingües previamente entrenados y aún no se ha evaluado completamente en sus homólogos multilingües. Este trabajo investiga tres aspectos de la poda estructurada en modelos lingüísticos multilingües preentrenados: configuración, algoritmos y eficiencia. Los experimentos en nueve tareas posteriores muestran varios fenómenos contradictorios: para los ajustes, la poda individual para cada idioma no induce un mejor resultado; para los algoritmos, el método más simple funciona mejor; para la eficiencia, un modelo rápido no implica que también sea pequeño. Para facilitar la comparación en todos los niveles de dispersión, presentamos la dispersión dinámica, un enfoque simple que permite entrenar el modelo una vez y adaptarse a diferentes tamaños de modelo en la inferencia. Esperamos que este trabajo llene el vacío en el estudio de la poda estructurada en modelos multilingües preentrenados y arroje luz sobre futuras investigaciones.', 'pt': 'A poda estruturada foi extensivamente estudada em modelos de linguagem pré-treinados monolíngues e ainda não foi totalmente avaliada em suas contrapartes multilíngues. Este trabalho investiga três aspectos da poda estruturada em modelos de linguagem pré-treinados multilíngues: configurações, algoritmos e eficiência. Experimentos em nove tarefas posteriores mostram vários fenômenos contra-intuitivos: para configurações, a poda individual para cada idioma não induz a um melhor resultado; para algoritmos, o método mais simples tem o melhor desempenho; para eficiência, um modelo rápido não implica que também seja pequeno. Para facilitar a comparação em todos os níveis de esparsidade, apresentamos o Dynamic Sparsification, uma abordagem simples que permite treinar o modelo uma vez e adaptá-lo a diferentes tamanhos de modelo na inferência. Esperamos que este trabalho preencha a lacuna no estudo da poda estruturada em modelos multilíngues pré-treinados e ilumine pesquisas futuras.', 'fr': "L'élagage structuré a fait l'objet d'études approfondies sur des modèles linguistiques monolingues pré-entraînés et n'a pas encore été pleinement évalué sur ses homologues multilingues. Ce travail étudie trois aspects de l'élagage structuré sur des modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés multilingues\xa0: les paramètres, les algorithmes et l'efficacité. Les expériences sur neuf tâches en aval montrent plusieurs phénomènes contre-intuitifs\xa0: pour les réglages, l'élagage individuel pour chaque langue n'induit pas un meilleur résultat\xa0; pour les algorithmes, la méthode la plus simple est la meilleure\xa0; pour l'efficacité, un modèle rapide n'implique pas qu'il soit également petit. Pour faciliter la comparaison à tous les niveaux de parcimonie, nous présentons la Sparsification dynamique, une approche simple qui permet d'entraîner le modèle une seule fois et de l'adapter aux différentes tailles de modèle lors de l'inférence. Nous espérons que ce travail comblera les lacunes dans l'étude de l'élagage structuré sur des modèles pré-entraînés multilingues et éclairera les recherches futures.", 'ja': '構造化された枝刈りは、単一言語の事前トレーニングされた言語モデルで広範囲にわたって研究されており、まだ多言語対応モデルで完全に評価されていません。この研究では、多言語事前トレーニングされた言語モデル上の構造化された枝刈りの3つの側面、設定、アルゴリズム、および効率性を調査します。9つのダウンストリーム・タスクの実験では、いくつかの反直感的な現象が示されています。設定については、各言語の個別の枝刈りはより良い結果をもたらすものではありません。アルゴリズムについては、最も単純な方法が最良の結果をもたらします。効率については、高速モデルはそれが小さいことも意味しません。すべての希少性レベルの比較を容易にするために、ダイナミックスパーシフィケーションを提示します。これは、モデルを一度トレーニングし、推論で異なるモデルサイズに適応させることができるシンプルなアプローチです。この研究が、多言語事前トレーニングモデルの構造化された枝刈りの研究のギャップを埋め、将来の研究を明らかにすることを願っています。', 'zh': '结构化剪已于单语预训语体,而未详于多言对应物也。 其治多语言预训语言模结构化剪者三:曰设,曰算法,曰效率。 九下之实验,反直觉数者:设言独剪,不失其宜; 其于算法,至简为上;其于算法,至简为上。 为提高效率,疾模非小也。 凡诸疏性水平,动作稀疏化,此简法也,许习模一次,推理大小。 愿补多言预训模结构化剪研空白,为来世开示。', 'hi': 'संरचित छंटाई को मोनोलिंगुअल पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल पर बड़े पैमाने पर अध्ययन किया गया है और अभी तक उनके बहुभाषी समकक्षों पर पूरी तरह से मूल्यांकन नहीं किया गया है। यह काम बहुभाषी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल पर संरचित छंटाई के तीन पहलुओं की जांच करता है: सेटिंग्स, एल्गोरिदम और दक्षता। नौ डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों पर प्रयोग कई काउंटर-सहज ज्ञान युक्त घटनाओं को दिखाते हैं: सेटिंग्स के लिए, प्रत्येक भाषा के लिए व्यक्तिगत रूप से छंटाई एक बेहतर परिणाम को प्रेरित नहीं करती है; एल्गोरिदम के लिए, सबसे सरल विधि सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करती है; दक्षता के लिए, एक तेज मॉडल का मतलब यह नहीं है कि यह भी छोटा है। सभी sparsity स्तरों पर तुलना की सुविधा के लिए, हम गतिशील Sparsification, एक सरल दृष्टिकोण है कि एक बार मॉडल प्रशिक्षण और अनुमान पर विभिन्न मॉडल आकारों के लिए अनुकूलन की अनुमति देता है प्रस्तुत करते हैं. हमें उम्मीद है कि यह काम बहुभाषी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित मॉडल पर संरचित छंटाई के अध्ययन में अंतर को भरता है और भविष्य के शोध पर प्रकाश डालता है।', 'ru': 'Структурированная обрезка была широко изучена на одноязычных предварительно обученных языковых моделях и еще не полностью оценена на их многоязычных аналогах. Эта работа исследует три аспекта структурированной обрезки на многоязычных предварительно обученных языковых моделях: настройки, алгоритмы и эффективность. Эксперименты по девяти последующим задачам показывают несколько противоречивых интуитивных явлений: для настроек индивидуальная обрезка для каждого языка не вызывает лучшего результата; для алгоритмов самый простой метод работает лучше; для эффективности быстрая модель не подразумевает, что она также мала. Чтобы облегчить сравнение на всех уровнях редкости, мы представляем Dynamic Sparsification, простой подход, который позволяет обучать модель один раз и адаптироваться к различным размерам модели при выводе. Мы надеемся, что эта работа восполнит пробел в исследовании структурированной обрезки на многоязычных предварительно обученных моделях и прольет свет на будущие исследования.', 'ga': 'Tá dianstaidéar déanta ar bhearradh struchtúrtha ar mhúnlaí teanga réamhoilte aonteangacha agus tá sé le measúnú iomlán fós ar a gcomhghleacaithe ilteangacha. Fiosraíonn an obair seo trí ghné de bearradh struchtúrtha ar mhúnlaí ilteangacha réamhoilte teanga: suíomhanna, algartaim, agus éifeachtúlacht. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar naoi dtasc iartheachtacha roinnt feiniméin fhrithiomasach: i gcás suíomhanna, ní chothaítear toradh níos fearr as bearradh aonair do gach teanga; i gcás halgartaim, is é an modh is simplí a fheidhmíonn is fearr; le haghaidh éifeachtúlachta, ní thugann múnla tapa le tuiscint go bhfuil sé beag freisin. Chun comparáid a dhéanamh ar gach leibhéal teimhneachta a éascú, cuirimid i láthair Dinimiciúla Éagsúlaithe, cur chuige simplí a cheadaíonn an tsamhail a oiliúint uair amháin agus é a oiriúnú do mhéideanna samhlacha éagsúla ag tátal. Tá súil againn go líonfaidh an obair seo an bhearna sa staidéar ar bhearradh struchtúrtha ar mhúnlaí ilteangacha réamhoilte agus go dtabharfaidh sí léargas ar thaighde amach anseo.', 'hu': 'A strukturált metszést széles körben tanulmányozták egynyelvű, előre képzett nyelvi modelleken, és még nem értékelték teljes körűen többnyelvű társaikon. Ez a munka a strukturált metszés három aspektusát vizsgálja többnyelvű előképzett nyelvi modelleken: beállítások, algoritmusok és hatékonyság. Kilenc downstream feladaton végzett kísérletek számos ellenintuitív jelenséget mutatnak: a beállításoknál az egyes nyelvek egyedi metszése nem eredményez jobb eredményt; algoritmusok esetében a legegyszerűbb módszer teljesíti a legjobbat; A hatékonyság érdekében a gyors modell nem jelenti azt, hogy kicsi is. Az összehasonlítás megkönnyítése érdekében bemutatjuk a Dynamic Sparsification (Dinamikus Sparsification), egy egyszerű megközelítést, amely lehetővé teszi a modell egyszeri edzését és a különböző modellméretekhez való alkalmazkodást következtetéskor. Reméljük, hogy ez a munka kitölti a többnyelvű, előre képzett modelleken végzett strukturált metszés tanulmányozásának hiányát, és rávilágít a jövőbeli kutatásokra.', 'el': 'Το δομημένο κλάδεμα έχει μελετηθεί εκτενώς σε μονογλωσσικά προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα και δεν έχει ακόμη αξιολογηθεί πλήρως στους πολύγλωσσους ομολόγους τους. Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά τρεις πτυχές του δομημένου κλαδέματος σε πολύγλωσσα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα: ρυθμίσεις, αλγόριθμοι και αποτελεσματικότητα. Τα πειράματα σε εννέα μεταγενέστερες εργασίες δείχνουν αρκετά αντιφατικά φαινόμενα: για τις ρυθμίσεις, το μεμονωμένο κλάδεμα για κάθε γλώσσα δεν προκαλεί καλύτερο αποτέλεσμα. για αλγόριθμους, η απλούστερη μέθοδος αποδίδει το καλύτερο. για την αποτελεσματικότητα, ένα γρήγορο μοντέλο δεν σημαίνει ότι είναι επίσης μικρό. Για να διευκολυνθεί η σύγκριση σε όλα τα επίπεδα σπανιότητας, παρουσιάζουμε τη δυναμική σπανιοποίηση, μια απλή προσέγγιση που επιτρέπει την εκπαίδευση του μοντέλου μία φορά και την προσαρμογή σε διαφορετικά μεγέθη μοντέλων κατά την εξαγωγή. Ελπίζουμε ότι το έργο αυτό θα καλύψει το κενό στη μελέτη του δομημένου κλαδέματος σε πολύγλωσσα προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα και θα ρίξει φως στη μελλοντική έρευνα.', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურაციული სურათი მონოლენგური წინასწარმოადგენული ენის მოდელზე გასწავლია და ისინი მრავალენგური კონტაქტებზე უფრო უფრო გაუმუშავება. ეს სამუშაო შესახებ მრავალენგიური წინასწარმოადგენებული ენის მოდელზე სტრუქტურაციის სამი აპექტები: პარამეტრები, ალგორიტები და ეფექტიურობა. ცხრავად ქვემოსტრამიული დავალების ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება რამდენიმე კონტრუტიური ფენომენტები: პარამეტრებისთვის, ყოველ ენათის განმავლობაში, უფრო უფრო ალგორიტემისთვის, ყველაზე საუკეთესო პროცემის გავაკეთება ყველაზე საუკეთესო; ეფექტიფიკაციისთვის, სწრაფად მოდელი არ იტყვებს, რომ ეს ასევე პატარა. რომელიც ყველა სპერციტიური დონეზე შემდგენება, ჩვენ დინამიკური სპერციფიკაციას გამოყენებთ, რომელიც მხოლოდ მოდელის შემდგენება ერთხელ და განსხვავებას განსხვავებას მოდელი ნაეწგამვ ჟვ, ფვ რაჱთ პაბჲრა ჱაოყლნთ პაჱლთკარა გ ჟრპსკრსპაუთწრა ნა მლთნდჲლთნჟკთ ოპვერპვნთპანთ მჲევლთ თ ოპჲეყლზაგა ჟგვრლთნა ნა ბყევღვრჲ თჱჟლვე', 'lt': 'Struktūrinis smulkinimas buvo išsamiai ištirtas naudojant vienakalbius iš anksto parengtus kalbos modelius ir dar turi būti visapusiškai įvertintas atsižvelgiant į jų daugiakalbius partnerius. Šiame darbe nagrinėjami trys struktūrizuoto mėšlo nuėmimo daugiakalbiais iš anksto parengtais kalbų modeliais aspektai: nustatymai, algoritmai ir veiksmingumas. Devynių tolesnių užduočių eksperimentai rodo keletą priešingų intuityvių reiškinių: nustatymų atveju kiekvienos kalbos atskirai nuslėpimas nesukelia geresnio rezultato; algoritmų atveju paprasčiausias metodas yra geriausias; efektyvumo atžvilgiu greitas model is nereiškia, kad jis taip pat mažas. Siekiant palengvinti palyginimą visais nedidelio masto lygiais, pristatome dinaminį spartifikavimą, paprastą metodą, leidžiantį vieną kartą mokyti model į ir prisitaikyti prie skirtingų modelių dydžių pagal išvadą. We hope this work fills the gap in the study of structured pruning on multilingual pre-trained models and sheds light on future research.', 'kk': 'Құрастырылған құрылғы бірнеше тіл үлгілерінде бірнеше тіл үлгілерінде оқылған, бірақ олардың көптеген тілдерінің көптеген мәліметтеріне толық оқылмайды. Бұл жұмыс бірнеше тілді алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілерінде құрылған құрылғының үш аспектін зерттейді: параметрлері, алгоритмдер және эффективнік. Тоғыз төменгі тапсырмалардың тәжірибесі бірнеше қарсы интуитивтік пайдалануларын көрсетеді: баптаулар үшін, әрбір тілде тәжірибесі жақсы нәтижесін көрсетеді. алгоритмдер үшін ең қарапайым әдіс ең жақсы жұмыс істейді; еффективтік үшін, жылдам үлгісі де кішкентай деп ойламайды. Бүкіл кеңістік деңгейлерді салыстыру үшін динамикалық спарсификациясын көмектесеміз. Бұл үлгі бір рет оқытуға мүмкіндік береді және басқа үлгі өлшемдерге өзгертуге мүмкінд Бұл жұмыс бірнеше тілдерді алдын- ала оқылған моделдер туралы құрылған құрылғының зерттеулерінің аралығын толып, келесі зерттеулерге жарықты жарық береді деп үміттенік.', 'it': "La potatura strutturata è stata ampiamente studiata su modelli linguistici monolingue pre-formati e deve ancora essere pienamente valutata sulle loro controparti multilingue. Questo lavoro indaga tre aspetti della potatura strutturata su modelli linguistici multilingue pre-formati: impostazioni, algoritmi ed efficienza. Esperimenti su nove attività a valle mostrano diversi fenomeni controintuitivi: per le impostazioni, la potatura individuale per ogni lingua non induce un risultato migliore; per gli algoritmi, il metodo più semplice esegue il meglio; per efficienza, un modello veloce non implica che sia anche piccolo. Per facilitare il confronto su tutti i livelli di sparsificazione, presentiamo Dynamic Sparsification, un approccio semplice che permette di allenare il modello una volta sola e adattandosi alle diverse dimensioni del modello all'inferenza. Speriamo che questo lavoro colmi il vuoto nello studio della potatura strutturata su modelli plurilingue pre-formati e faccia luce sulla ricerca futura.", 'mk': 'Структурираното прскање е екстремно проучено на монојазични предобучени јазички модели и сé уште не е целосно проценето на нивните мултијазични колеги. Оваа работа ги истражува трите аспекти на структурираното исцепување на мултијазичните предобучени јазички модели: поставувања, алгоритми и ефикасност. Експериментите на девет понатамошни задачи покажуваат неколку контра-интуитивни феномени: за поставувањата, индивидуално исцепување за секој јазик не предизвикува подобар резултат; за алгоритмите, наједноставниот метод е најдобар; за ефикасност, брз модел не значи дека е исто така мал. To facilitate the comparison on all sparsity levels, we present Dynamic Sparsification, a simple approach that allows training the model once and adapting to different model sizes at inference.  Се надеваме дека оваа работа ќе ја пополни празнината во студијата за структурирано исцепување на мултијазични предобучени модели и ќе објасни идни истражувања.', 'ms': 'Pemotongan struktur telah dipelajari secara ekstensif pada model bahasa monobahasa yang dilatih-dilatih dan belum dapat diuji sepenuhnya pada rekan-rekan berbilang bahasa mereka. Kerja ini menyelidiki tiga aspek pemotongan struktur pada model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih berbilang bahasa: tetapan, algoritma, dan efisiensi. Eksperimen pada sembilan tugas turun menunjukkan beberapa fenomena lawan-intuitif: untuk tetapan, pencucian secara individu untuk setiap bahasa tidak mengakibatkan keputusan yang lebih baik; bagi algoritma, kaedah paling sederhana melakukan yang terbaik; untuk efisiensi, model cepat tidak bermakna ia juga kecil. Untuk memudahkan perbandingan pada semua aras kecepatan, kita memperkenalkan Penyelamatan Dinamik, pendekatan sederhana yang membolehkan latihan model sekali dan menyesuaikan kepada saiz model yang berbeza pada kesimpulan. Kami berharap pekerjaan ini memenuhi ruang dalam kajian pemotongan struktur pada model yang dilatih-dilatih berbilang bahasa dan memberi cahaya kepada kajian masa depan.', 'ml': 'നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മോണോളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് വിശാലമായി പഠിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അവര മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട മൂന്നു ഭാഗങ്ങളെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d, ആല്\u200dഗോരിത താഴെ ഒമ്പത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്ന പല വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു; സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്, ഓരോ ഭാഷയ്ക്കും വേണ്ട ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200dക്ക്, ഏറ്റവും എളുപ്പമുള്ള രീതി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു; സാധ്യതയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി ഒരു വേഗം മോഡല്\u200d ചെറുതാണെന്ന് കരുതുന്നില്ല. To facilitate the comparison on all sparsity levels, we present Dynamic Sparsification, a simple approach that allows training the model once and adapting to different model sizes at inference.  നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d പല ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200dക്കും മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കു', 'mt': 'Il-pruning strutturat ġie studjat b’mod estensiv fuq mudelli monolingwi ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel u għad irid jiġi evalwat bis-sħiħ fuq il-kontropartijiet multilingwi tagħhom. Dan ix-xogħol jinvestiga tliet aspetti tal-pruning strutturat fuq mudelli multilingwi ta’ lingwa mħarrġa minn qabel: settijiet, algoritmi, u effiċjenza. L-esperimenti fuq disa’ kompiti downstream juru diversi fenomeni kontro-intwittivi: għal settijiet, il-pruning individwali għal kull lingwa ma jinduċix riżultat a ħjar; għall-algoritmi, l-aktar metodu sempliċi jwettaq l-aħjar; għall-effiċjenza, mudell mgħa ġġel ma jimplikax li huwa żgħir ukoll. Biex jiġi ffaċilitat it-tqabbil fuq il-livelli kollha ta’ sparsità, qed nippreżentaw Sparsifikazzjoni Dinamika, approċċ sempliċi li jippermetti t-taħriġ tal-mudell darba u l-adattament għal daqsijiet differenti tal-mudell fl-inferenza. Nittamaw li din il-ħidma timla d-distakk fl-istudju tal-pruning strutturat fuq mudelli multilingwi mħarrġa minn qabel u tagħti dawl lir-riċerka futura.', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүний нэг хэлний өмнө сургалтын загвар дээр маш их судалсан. Гэвч олон хэлний хамтрагчдад бүрэн үнэлгээ өгөхгүй байна. Энэ ажил олон хэлний өмнө суралцагдсан хэл загварын бүтээгдэхүүний гурван асуудлыг судалж байна: загвар, алгоритм, үр дүнтэй. 9 давхар үйл ажиллагааны туршилт олон эсэргүүцэл үзэгдлийг харуулдаг: хэл бүрийн хувьд хэн бүрийн хувьд хэрэглэх нь илүү сайн үр дүнг бий болгодоггүй. алгоритмын хувьд хамгийн хялбар арга нь хамгийн сайн ажилладаг. Хурдан загвар нь бас жижиг гэсэн үг биш. Бүх жижигхэн түвшинд харьцуулахын тулд бид Динамик Спарсификацийг ашиглаж, загварыг нэг удаа суралцах боломжтой, инфекцийн өөр загварын хэмжээнд адаптацийг ашиглаж байна. Бид энэ ажил олон хэл дээр сургалтын өмнө сургалтын загварыг судалж, ирээдүйн судалгаанд гэрлийг нэмэгдүүлдэг гэж найдаж байна.', 'ro': 'Tăierea structurată a fost studiată pe scară largă pe modele lingvistice pre-instruite monolingve și nu este încă evaluată pe deplin pe omologii lor multilingvi. Această lucrare investighează trei aspecte ale tăierii structurate pe modele lingvistice pre-instruite multilingve: setări, algoritmi și eficiență. Experimentele pe nouă sarcini din aval arată mai multe fenomene contraintuitive: pentru setări, tăierea individuală pentru fiecare limbă nu induce un rezultat mai bun; pentru algoritmi, cea mai simplă metodă performează cel mai bine; pentru eficiență, un model rapid nu implică faptul că este, de asemenea, mic. Pentru a facilita comparația la toate nivelurile de sparsificare dinamică, o abordare simplă care permite antrenarea modelului o dată și adaptarea la diferite dimensiuni ale modelului la inferență. Sperăm că această lucrare va umple golul din studiul tăierii structurate pe modele preinstruite multilingv și va face lumină asupra cercetărilor viitoare.', 'no': 'Strukturert prøving er utvida studiert på monospråk før- trenga språk- modeller, og er enno fullstendig evaluert på dei fleirspråk mottalene sine. Dette arbeidet undersøker tre aspektar av strukturerte prøving på fleirspråksprøvingsmodeller: innstillingar, algoritme og effektivitet. Eksperimentar på ni nedstrømmeoppgåver viser fleire mot intuitiv fenomenar: for innstillingar, individuelt prøving for kvar språk fører ikkje ein bedre resultat. for algoritmer utfører den enkleste metoden den beste; og for effektivitet betyr ikkje ein rask modell at det også er lite. For å letta samanlikninga på alle sparsitetsnivåane, presenterer vi dynamisk sparsitering, ein enkel tilnærming som tillater å lære modellen ein gong og tilpassa til ulike modelstorleikar ved infeksjon. Vi håper at dette arbeidet fyller mellomrommet i studien av strukturert prøving på fleirspråk føretrengte modeller og gjer lys på framtidige forskning.', 'sr': 'Strukturirani obrezak je široko proučen na monojezičkim predobučenim jezičkim modelima, a još uvek se potpuno procjenjuje na njihovim multijezičkim kolegama. Ovaj rad istražuje tri aspekta strukturiranog pružanja na multijezičkim predobučenim jezičkim modelima: postavke, algoritme i efikasnost. Eksperimenti na devet zadataka u skladištu pokazuju nekoliko kontraintuitivnih fenomena: za postavke, individualno pružanje za svaki jezik ne inducira bolji rezultat; za algoritme, najjednostavniji metod izvršava najbolje; za učinkovitost, brz model ne znači da je i mali. Da bi olakšali usporedbu na svim nivoima sparsiteta, predstavljamo dinamičku sparsifikaciju, jednostavan pristup koji omogućava trening model a jednom i prilagoditi se različitim veličinama modela u infekciji. Nadamo se da će ovaj rad ispuniti prazninu u studiji strukturiranog pružanja na multijezičkim predobučenim modelima i prosvetljavati budućim istraživanjima.', 'si': 'නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ එක භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම තව මේ වැඩේ ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාවක් මෝඩේල් වල සංස්ථානය තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: සැකසුම්, ඇල් පරීක්ෂණයක් නැති වැඩේ වැඩේ අවධානයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්: සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන්, හැම භාෂාවට වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාර ඇල්ගෝරිත්ම් වලට, සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාව හොඳම විද්\u200dයාව කරන්න; වේගයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් කියන්නේ නෑ ඒක පොඩි කියලා. සියළුම ස්පාර්සිටි ස්ථානයේ සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය ස්පාර්සිෆිකේෂන් වෙනුවෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200d අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙන්නේ මේ වැඩේ විශ්වාස කරනවා අනාගතයේ සංස්ථාපිත විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200d', 'pl': 'Strukturalne przycinanie zostało szeroko zbadane na jednojęzycznych modelach językowych wstępnie przeszkolonych i jeszcze nie zostało w pełni ocenione na ich wielojęzycznych odpowiednikach. Niniejsza praca bada trzy aspekty strukturalnego przycinania na wielojęzycznych wstępnie przeszkolonych modelach językowych: ustawienia, algorytmy i efektywność. Eksperymenty na dziewięciu dalszych zadaniach pokazują kilka nieintuicyjnych zjawisk: w przypadku ustawień indywidualne przycinanie dla każdego języka nie przynosi lepszego wyniku; w przypadku algorytmów najprostsza metoda działa najlepiej; ze względu na wydajność szybki model nie oznacza, że jest on również mały. Aby ułatwić porównanie na wszystkich poziomach rzadkości, prezentujemy Dynamic Sparsification, proste podejście, które umożliwia jednorazowe szkolenie modelu i dostosowanie się do różnych rozmiarów modelu przy wnioskowaniu. Mamy nadzieję, że praca ta wypełni lukę w badaniu strukturalnego przycinania na wielojęzycznych modelach wstępnie przeszkolonych i rzuci światło na przyszłe badania.', 'sv': 'Strukturerad beskärning har utförligt studerats på enspråkiga förkunskaper och har ännu inte utvärderats fullt ut på deras flerspråkiga motsvarigheter. Detta arbete undersöker tre aspekter av strukturerad beskärning på flerspråkiga förklädda språkmodeller: inställningar, algoritmer och effektivitet. Experiment på nio nedströmsuppgifter visar på flera kontraintuitiva fenomen: för inställningar ger individuell beskärning för varje språk inte ett bättre resultat. För algoritmer presterar den enklaste metoden bäst. för effektivitet innebär en snabb modell inte att den också är liten. För att underlätta jämförelsen på alla sparsity nivåer presenterar vi Dynamic Sparsification, ett enkelt tillvägagångssätt som gör det möjligt att träna modellen en gång och anpassa sig till olika modellstorlekar vid inferens. Vi hoppas att detta arbete fyller luckan i studien av strukturerad beskärning på flerspråkiga förutbildade modeller och belyser framtida forskning.', 'ur': 'ساختہ تحرینگ ایک زبان سے پہلے تعلیم کی زبان مدل پر پڑھی گئی ہے اور اب تک ان کے بہت سی زبان کنٹر پر پوری قدرت کی جاتی ہے یہ کام بہت سی زبان کی پیش تربین کی زبان کی مدلکوں پر تین ساختہ بصیرت کی تحقیق کرتا ہے: سیٹیوں، الگوریتم، اور فعالیت. نو لائنٹریم کے کاموں کی آزمائش بہت سی غیر نظریہ کے مطابق دکھاتی ہیں: تنظیمات کے لئے، ہر زبان کے لئے ایک دوسرے سے غیر نظریہ کرنا بہتر نتیجہ نہیں ہے۔ الگوریتم کے لئے سب سے ساده طریقہ بہترین عمل کرتا ہے۔ فعالیت کے لئے، ایک سریع موڈل کا معنی نہیں ہے کہ یہ بھی چھوٹا ہے۔ تمام سپٹیٹی سطح کے مقایسہ کو آسان کرنے کے لئے، ہم دینامیک سپٹیفٹ کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک ساده طریقہ جو ایک بار مدل کی تعلیم دینے کی اجازت دیتا ہے اور ایک بار مختلف مدل کی سازوں کے ساتھ تدبیر کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے۔ ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ یہ کام بہت سی زبانوں سے پہلے تعلیم کی مدل پر ساختہ پرینگ کی تحقیق میں فاصلہ پورا کرتا ہے اور مستقبل تحقیق پر نور پھیلاتا ہے۔', 'so': 'Sida badan waxaa lagu baray qorniinka afka hore oo monoli ah, oo weli lama qiimeynayo saaxiibbadooda luuqadaha kala duduwan. This work investigates three aspects of structured pruning on multilingual pre-trained language models: settings, algorithms, and efficiency.  Imtixaamo ku saabsan sagaal shaqooyin hoose waxay muujiyaan waxyaabo badan oo ka gees ah: sida loo sameeyo, tusaale ahaan si gaar ah looga baaraandegayo luuqad kastaba ma sababto mid ka wanaagsan; waayo algorithm, qaabka ugu fudud ayaa sameeya waxa ugu wanaagsan; saameyn u leh, tusaale dhaqso ahna ma ahan in uu yaryahay. Si aan u fududeeyo barbardhigga heerarka oo dhan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa sawiridda dhaqdhaqaaqa, qaab fudud oo u sahlan karta barashada modellka marka iyo si loo beddelo tirada modellka oo kala duduwan cudurka. Waxaan rajaynaynaa in shuqulkaasu uu buuxiyo kala duwan baaritaanka lagu qoray tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo luuqadaha kala duduwan, wuxuuna muujiyaa iftiinka waxbarashada mustaqbalka ah.', 'ta': 'உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரிகள் மீது விரிவாக படிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் இன்னும் அவர்கள் பல மொழி எதிர்பாடுகளில்  இந்த வேலை பல மொழி முன்பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளில் அமைக்கப்பட்ட மூன்று பகுதிகளைத் தேடுகிறது. அமைப்புகள், ஆல்கிரிட்டம் மற்றும் விளைவ ஒன்பது கீழ்நோக்கு பணிகளில் உள்ள முயற்சிகள் பல எதிர்பார்க்கும் செயல்களை காட்டுகிறது: அமைப்புகளுக்கு, ஒவ்வொரு மொழிக்கும் தனிப் முறையில் சிறந்த முறையை செயல்படுத்துகிறது; வேகமான மாதிரி அது சிறியதாக இருக்கும் என்பதை குறிக்கவில்லை. எல்லா ஒப்பிடு மட்டங்களையும் ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு, நாம் நிகழ்த்துகிறோம் Dynamic Sparsification, ஒரு சுலபமான வழி மாதிரியை ஒரு முறை பயிற்சி மற்றும் மாதிரி அளவுகள நாம் நம்புகிறோம் இந்த வேலை பிரச்சனையை நிரப்பும் பல மொழி முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் மீது கட்டமைப்பாட்டில் சி', 'uz': "Name Bu ishni bir necha tildan oldin o'rganilgan tilning modellarida tuzilgan uch qismni o'rganadi: moslamalar, algoritm va effektligi. Toʻqqish vazifalarda 9 ta'lim jarayonlarini ko'pchilik foydalanuvchi holatlarni ko'rsatadi: moslamalar uchun, har bir tillarni boshqarish natijasi yaxshi natijaga ishga tushirilmaydi; algoritlarga, oddiy usul eng yaxshi ishlaydi; ta'sirlik uchun tez model bu kichkina narsa emas. Ko'rib chiqishga ishlatish uchun biz Dynamic Spanish soʻzlarini hosil qilamiz, bu modelni bir marta o'rganishga ruxsat beradi va bir necha modelning sizlariga o'zgartirishga imkoniyat beradi. Biz bu ishni bir necha tildan oldin o'rganilgan modellarni o'rganishni o'rganishda gap beradi va kelajakda o'rganishni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Cấu trúc cắt tỉa đã được nghiên cứu kỹ lưỡng về các mô hình ngôn ngữ đa ngôn ngữ được đào tạo và chưa được đánh giá đầy đủ về các đối tượng đa dạng. Việc này nghiên cứu ba khía cạnh của việc cắt tỉa cấu trúc trên các mô hình ngôn ngữ đa dạng được huấn luyện: thiết lập, thuật toán, và hiệu quả. Những thử nghiệm với chín công việc xuôi dòng cho thấy vài hiện tượng ngược trực giác: với thiết lập, việc tỉa từng thứ ngôn ngữ không tạo ra kết quả tốt hơn. với thuật toán, phương pháp đơn giản nhất hoàn thành tốt nhất. một mô hình nhanh không có nghĩa là nó cũng nhỏ. Để dễ dàng so sánh trên tất cả các cấp độ hẹp, chúng tôi giới thiệu Dynamic Sparsition, một phương pháp đơn giản cho phép huấn luyện mô hình một lần và thích nghi với các cỡ mô hình khác nhau ở kết quả. Chúng tôi hy vọng công việc này lấp đầy khoảng trống trong nghiên cứu về sự cắt tỉa cấu trúc trên các mô hình đa dạng được huấn luyện và làm sáng tỏ nghiên cứu tương lai.', 'da': 'Struktureret beskæring er blevet grundigt undersøgt på ensprogede præuddannede sprogmodeller og er endnu ikke fuldt ud evalueret på deres flersprogede modparter. Dette arbejde undersøger tre aspekter af struktureret beskæring på flersprogede prætrænede sprogmodeller: indstillinger, algoritmer og effektivitet. Eksperimenter med ni nedstrømsopgaver viser flere kontraintuitive fænomener: For indstillinger giver individuel beskæring for hvert sprog ikke et bedre resultat. for algoritmer udfører den enkleste metode bedst; for effektivitet betyder en hurtig model ikke, at den også er lille. For at lette sammenligningen på alle sparsitetsniveauer præsenterer vi Dynamic Sparsification, en enkel tilgang, der gør det muligt at træne modellen én gang og tilpasse sig forskellige modelstørrelser ved inferensen. Vi håber, at dette arbejde udfylder hullet i undersøgelsen af struktureret beskæring på flersprogede præuddannede modeller og kaster lys over fremtidig forskning.', 'nl': 'Gestructureerd snoeien is uitgebreid bestudeerd op eentalige voorgetrainde taalmodellen en moet nog volledig worden geëvalueerd op hun meertalige tegenhangers. Dit werk onderzoekt drie aspecten van gestructureerd snoeien op meertalig voorgetrainde taalmodellen: instellingen, algoritmes en efficiëntie. Experimenten met negen downstream taken tonen verschillende contra-intuïtieve fenomenen aan: voor instellingen leidt individueel snoeien voor elke taal niet tot een beter resultaat; voor algoritmen, de eenvoudigste methode presteert het beste; Voor efficiëntie betekent een snel model niet dat het ook klein is. Om de vergelijking op alle sparsity niveaus te vergemakkelijken, presenteren we Dynamic Sparsification, een eenvoudige aanpak die het mogelijk maakt het model eenmaal te trainen en zich bij inferentie aan te passen aan verschillende modelgrootte. We hopen dat dit werk de leemte opvult in de studie van gestructureerd snoeien op meertalige voorgetrainde modellen en licht werpt op toekomstig onderzoek.', 'bg': 'Структурираното подрязване е широко проучено на едноезични предварително обучени езикови модели и тепърва предстои да бъде напълно оценено на многоезичните им колеги. Тази работа изследва три аспекта на структурираното подрязване на многоезични предварително обучени езикови модели: настройки, алгоритми и ефективност. Експериментите по девет задачи надолу по веригата показват няколко противоинтуитивни явления: за настройките индивидуалното подрязване на всеки език не предизвиква по-добър резултат; за алгоритми най-простият метод изпълнява най-добре; за ефективност бързият модел не означава, че той също е малък. За да улесним сравнението на всички нива на спарситет, представяме един прост подход, който позволява обучение на модела веднъж и адаптиране към различни размери на модела при заключение. Надяваме се тази работа да запълни празнината в изследването на структурираното подрязване на многоезични предварително обучени модели и да хвърли светлина върху бъдещите изследвания.', 'de': 'Strukturiertes Beschneiden wurde eingehend an einsprachigen vortrainierten Sprachmodellen untersucht und muss noch vollständig auf ihre mehrsprachigen Pendants ausgewertet werden. Diese Arbeit untersucht drei Aspekte des strukturierten Beschneidens auf mehrsprachigen vortrainierten Sprachmodellen: Einstellungen, Algorithmen und Effizienz. Experimente an neun nachgeschalteten Aufgaben zeigen mehrere kontraintuitive Phänomene: Für Einstellungen führt das individuelle Beschneiden für jede Sprache nicht zu einem besseren Ergebnis; Für Algorithmen funktioniert die einfachste Methode am besten; Für Effizienz bedeutet ein schnelles Modell nicht, dass es auch klein ist. Um den Vergleich auf allen Sparsitätsebenen zu erleichtern, stellen wir Dynamic Sparsification vor, einen einfachen Ansatz, der es ermöglicht, das Modell einmal zu trainieren und sich bei Inferenz an verschiedene Modellgrößen anzupassen. Wir hoffen, dass diese Arbeit die Lücke in der Studie des strukturierten Schnitts an mehrsprachigen vortrainierten Modellen schließt und Licht auf zukünftige Forschung wirft.', 'id': 'Pemotongan struktur telah dipelajari secara ekstensif pada model bahasa monobahasa yang sudah dilatih dan belum dipelajari sepenuhnya pada rekan-rekan berbilang bahasa mereka. Pekerjaan ini menyelidiki tiga aspek pemotongan struktur pada model bahasa multibahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya: pengaturan, algoritma, dan efisiensi. Eksperimen pada sembilan tugas turun menunjukkan beberapa fenomena anti-intuitif: untuk pengaturan, individu-individu pruning untuk setiap bahasa tidak menginduksi hasil yang lebih baik; untuk algoritma, metode paling sederhana melakukan yang terbaik; untuk efisiensi, model cepat tidak berarti bahwa model itu juga kecil. Untuk memudahkan perbandingan di semua tingkat kecepatan, kita mempersembahkan Dinamik Sparsification, pendekatan sederhana yang memungkinkan latihan model sekali dan menyesuaikan kepada ukuran model yang berbeda pada kesimpulan. Kami berharap pekerjaan ini memenuhi celah dalam penelitian strukturasi pemotongan pada model multibahasa yang terlatih dan memberikan cahaya pada penelitian masa depan.', 'hr': 'Strukturirani obrezak se široko proučavao na monojezičkim predobučenim jezičkim modelima, a još uvijek se potpuno procjenjuje na njihovim multijezičkim kolegama. Ovaj rad istražuje tri aspekta strukturiranog pružanja na multijezičkim predobučenim jezičkim modelima: postavke, algoritme i učinkovitost. Eksperimenti na devet nedaleko zadataka pokazuju nekoliko antiintuitivnih fenomena: za postavke, individualno pružanje za svaki jezik ne inducira bolji rezultat; za algoritme, najjednostavniji metod izvršava najbolje; za učinkovitost, brz model ne znači da je također mali. Da bismo olakšali usporedbu na svim razinama sparsiteta, predstavljamo dinamičku sparsifikaciju, jednostavan pristup koji omogućava treniranje model a jednom i prilagođenje različitim veličinama modela na infekciji. Nadamo se da će ovaj rad ispuniti prazninu u ispitivanju strukturiranog pružanja na multijezičkim predobučenim modelima i proširi svjetlo budućim istraživanjima.', 'ko': '구조화된 가지치기는 이미 단어가 미리 훈련된 언어 모델에서 광범위한 연구를 받았고 다중 언어 모델에서 충분한 평가를 받지 못했다.이 작업은 다중 언어가 미리 훈련된 언어 모델에서 구조화된 가지치기를 하는 세 가지 측면, 즉 설정, 알고리즘과 효율을 연구했다.9개의 하류 임무에서의 실험은 몇 가지 직감에 어긋나는 현상을 나타냈다. 설정에 대해 각 언어를 단독으로 편집하면 더 좋은 결과를 얻을 수 없다.알고리즘에 있어서 가장 간단한 방법이 가장 좋다.효율을 높이기 위해 빠른 모형은 그것도 작다는 것을 의미하지 않는다.모든 희소 단계에서 비교하는 데 편리하도록 우리는 동적 희소화를 제기했다. 이것은 간단한 방법으로 모델에 대해 한 번의 훈련을 허용하고 추리할 때 서로 다른 모델의 크기에 적응하도록 한다.우리는 이 작업이 다언어 예훈련 모델에서 구조화된 가지치기를 하는 연구 공백을 메우고 미래의 연구에 시사점을 제공하기를 바란다.', 'sw': 'Utafiti uliotengenezwa umesomwa kwa kiasi kikubwa juu ya mifano ya lugha zilizofundishwa kabla ya kimonolinguzi na bado haijathibitishwa kabisa juu ya wapinzani wao wa lugha mbalimbali. Kazi hii inachunguza vipengele vitatu vya ujenzi wa mifano ya lugha zilizofundishwa kwa lugha mbalimbali: mazingira, makubaliano na ufanisi. Majaribio kwenye kazi tisa za mito chini yanaonyesha matukio kadhaa yanayopinga upinzani: kwa mazingira, kuelewa kwa kila lugha haisababisha matokeo mazuri zaidi; kwa algorithi, njia rahisi inafanya vizuri zaidi; kwa ufanisi, muundo wa haraka haumaanishi kuwa pia ni ndogo. Ili kusaidia kulinganisha viwango vyote vya uchimbaji, tunaweka hatua rahisi ya Uhambuzi wa Dynamic, njia inayoruhusu mafunzo ya modeli kwa mara moja na kubadilisha kwa kiwango tofauti cha mifano katika ugonjwa wa hali ya hewa. Tunatumaini kazi hii inajaza tofauti katika utafiti wa ujenzi wa mifano ya vifundi vya lugha mbalimbali na kuonyesha mwanga juu ya utafiti wa baadaye.', 'fa': 'برق ساخته شده در مورد مدل\u200cهای پیش\u200cآموزش زبان یک زبان بسیار مطالعه شده و هنوز به طور کامل در مورد رفیق\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cهایشان ارزیابی می\u200cشود. این کار ۳ نقطه\u200cای از کاهش ساخته شده بر مدل\u200cهای زبان پیش آموزش\u200cشده\u200cاند، تحقیق می\u200cکند: تنظیم\u200cها، الگوریتم\u200cها و موثیت\u200cها. تجربه\u200cهای نو کار پایین پایین نشان می\u200cدهند چندین نمایش غیر نظریه: برای تنظیمات، تنظیمات شخصی برای هر زبان، نتیجه بهتر را پیش نمی\u200cدهد. برای الگوریتم، بهترین روش ساده بهترین انجام می دهد. برای فعالیت، یک مدل سریع معنی نمی\u200cدهد که کوچک است. برای آسانی کردن مقایسه روی همه سطح\u200cهای سفینه\u200cای، ما یک روش ساده\u200cای را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که اجازه می\u200cدهد مدل را یک بار آموزش دهد و به اندازه\u200cهای متفاوتی مدل در آلودگی تغییر دهد. امیدواریم این کار فاصله\u200cای در تحقیقات ساخته\u200cشده روی مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cهای زیادی زبان را پر کند و روشنی بر تحقیقات آینده می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Structured pruning has been widely studied on monolingual pre-trained language models. It is yet to be fully evaluated on their multilingual counterparts. Bu işe multi dillerden öň-bilim öňünde bilim sistemasynda yapılan prunçylygyň üç aspektini barlaýar: düzümler, algoritmalar we etkinlik. Dokuz indiki täzelikde örän netijesi birnäçe garşy netijesi görkezýär: düzümler üçin, her dil üçin garamak gowy netijesi ýok. Algoritmalar üçin, iň basit yöntem gowysyny edip bilýär; Işdeşik üçin tiz bir nusga kiçijek diýip kabul etmez. Bütin ýagtylyk derejesinde karşılaştyrylmagy ýeterlik etmek üçin dinamik Sparsifikasiýasyny görkezip berýäris. Bu nusga bir gezek öwretmek üçin we düşürmek üçin farklı nusga gollanan nusga mümkin edýäris. Biz bu işiň multi dilli öňünden öňünden eğlenen nusgalar barada ýagtylygy doldurmagyny umyt edýäris we gelejekde barlag üçin ýagtylygy çykarýar.', 'am': 'የተመሠረተ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች በሙሉ ተማርቷል፡፡ ይሄ ሥራ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች በፊት ተማሪ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ላይ የተመሠረቱትን ሦስት ጉዳይ ይፈልጋል፤ ማዘጋጃዎች፣ አልgorithም እና ፍቃድ፡፡ በዘጠኝ ወንዞች ስራ ላይ የሚሞክሩ ብዙ ተቃውሞ የሚቃወም አካባቢ ነገር ያሳየቃሉ፤ ለሁሉም ቋንቋዎች ለብቻው ማስታወቂያ የሚሻል ፍጻሜ አያስፈልግም፡፡ አሌጎርቲም፣ ቀላል ማድረግ መልካም ነው፡፡ ለጥያቄ ሞዴል ደግሞ ትንሽ እንደሆነ አይገልጽም፡፡ To facilitate the comparison on all sparsity levels, we present Dynamic Sparsification, a simple approach that allows training the model once and adapting to different model sizes at inference.  ይህ ሥራ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች በፊት ተማሪዎች ላይ የተመሠረተውን ትምህርት መፍጠርን እናስፈራራለን፡፡', 'af': "Struktuurde pruning is uitbreidig ondersoek op monolinglike vooraf-onderwerp taal modele en is nog volledig geevalueer op hul multilingse kunstenaars. Hierdie werk ondersoek drie aspekte van struktureerde pruning op multitaal voorafgeleerde taal modele: instellings, algoritme en effektiviteit. Eksperimente op nege onderstreem opdragte vertoon verskeie anti- intuitief fenomene: vir instellings, individuele pruning vir elke taal doen nie 'n beter resultaat induseer nie; vir algoritme, die eenvoudigste metode uitvoer die beste; vir effektief, 'n vinnige model beteken nie dat dit ook klein is nie. Om die vergelyking van alle sparsiteitsvlakke te maak, laat ons Dynamiske Sparsifikasie voorsien, 'n eenvoudige toegang wat toelaat om die model een keer te onderwerp en aan verskillende model grootte te pas by inferensie. Ons hoop dat hierdie werk die afstand in die studie van structureerde pruning op multitaalske voorafgeleerde modele vervul en lig op toekomstige ondersoek skei.", 'sq': 'Përpjekja e strukturuar është studiuar në mënyrë të gjerë mbi modelet monogjuhësore të paratrajnuara gjuhësh dhe ende duhet vlerësuar plotësisht mbi homologët e tyre shumëgjuhës. Ky punë heton tre aspekte të shqyrtimit të strukturuar në modelet e gjuhës shumëgjuhësore të trajnuara përpara: rregullime, algoritme dhe efektshmëri. Eksperimentet në nëntë detyra poshtë tregojnë disa fenomene kundër intuitive: për rregullimet, shkurtimi individualë për çdo gjuhë nuk indukton një rezultat më të mirë; për algoritmet, metoda më e thjeshtë bën më të mirën; për efektshmëri, një model i shpejtë nuk do të thotë se është gjithashtu i vogël. Për të lehtësuar krahasimin në të gjitha nivelet e paktësisë, ne paraqesim Shpirtimin Dinamik, një qasje të thjeshtë që lejon trajnimin e modelit një herë dhe përshtatjen në madhësitë e ndryshme të modelit në përfundim. Shpresojmë që ky punë të mbushë boshllëkun në studimin e shqyrtimit të strukturuar të modeleve shumëgjuhësore të paratrajnuar dhe të nxjerrë dritë në kërkimet e ardhshme.', 'bn': 'পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলে ব্যাপকভাবে গবেষণা করা হয়েছে এবং এখনো তাদের বহুভাষাভাষী প্রতিপক্ষে সম্পূর্ণ মূল্যায়ন করা যাচ্ছে না। এই কাজ অনেক ভাষার পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের উপর তিনটি প্রাক্কার তদন্ত করেছে: বৈশিষ্ট্য, অ্যালগরিদম এবং কার্যকর। নিচের নয়টি কাজের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে বেশ কিছু বিরোধী বিষয়: বৈশিষ্ট্যের জন্য, প্রত্যেক ভাষার জন্য ব্যক্তিগত চিন্তা কোন ভাল ফল আলগরিদমের জন্য, সবচেয়ে সহজ পদ্ধতি সবচেয়ে ভালো করে; কার্যকর্মের জন্য, একটি দ্রুত মডেল মানে না যে এটাও ছোট। সকল স্প্রাইসিটি স্তরের তুলনার জন্য আমরা ডায়ানামিক স্প্যাসারেফিকেশন উপস্থাপন করি, একটি সাধারণ উপায় যা মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করে একবার বিভিন্ন মড আমরা আশা করি এই কাজের মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ভাষার পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত মডেলের উপর গবেষণার মধ্যে বিভ্রান্ত হয়ে যায় এবং ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণায় আল', 'az': 'Yapılandırılmış pruning monodil öyrənmiş dil modelləri barəsində çox təhsil edilmişdir, amma çoxlu dil yoldaşları barəsində tamamilə təhsil edilməlidir. Bu işin çoxlu dil öyrənmiş dil modellərində strukturlu pruning üç aspektini incidir: qurğular, algoritmi, və təhsil. Dokuz a şağı təcrübələrin təcrübələri bir neçə-intuitiv fenomeni göstərir: tərəflər üçün, hər dil üçün indi təcrübə etmək daha yaxşı bir nəticə yaratmaz; algoritmi üçün ən asanlısı yol ən yaxşı işlədir. tərzim modeli də kiçik deyil. Bütün küçük səviyyələrinin karşılaşdırmasını asanlaşdırmaq üçün Dynamik Sparsifikasyonu, modeli bir dəfə təhsil etməyə imkan verən və infeksiyada müxtəlif modellərin böyüklüyünə uyğunlaşdırmağa imkan verən basit bir yol göstəririk. Biz ümid edirik ki, bu işin çoxlu dildən əvvəl təhsil edilmiş modellərdə strukturlu pruning öyrənməsinin boşluğunu tamamlayır və gələcək təhsil barəsində işıq açar.', 'hy': 'Կառուցված կտրվածքները մեծամասնությամբ ուսումնասիրել են մեկլեզու նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների վրա և դեռ պետք է լիովին գնահատվի իրենց բազլեզու մոդելների վրա: Այս աշխատանքը ուսումնասիրում է բազմալեզու նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների կառուցվածքավորման երեք ասպեկտները՝ հաստատությունները, ալգորիթմները և արդյունավետությունը: Նինը հետագա խնդիրների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս մի քանի հակա-ինտուիտիվ երևույթներ. սահմանափակումների համար յուրաքանչյուր լեզվի համար անհատական խզբզելը ավելի լավ արդյունք չի առաջացնում: ալգորիթմների համար ամենապարզ մեթոդը լավագույնն է, արդյունավետության համար արագ մոդելը չի նշանակում, որ այն նաև փոքր է: Որպեսզի հեշտացնենք համեմատությունը բոլոր հաճախականության մակարդակների վրա, մենք ներկայացնում ենք դինամիկ հաճախականությունը, մի պարզ մոտեցում, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս մի անգամ վարժեցնել մոդելը և հարմարվել տարբեր մոդելների չափերի վրա Մենք հույս ունենք, որ այս աշխատանքը լրացնում է բազմալեզու նախապատրաստված մոդելների կառուցվածքավորման ուսումնասիրության տարբերությունը և լուսավորում է ապագա ուսումնասիրությունները:', 'ca': "La pruning estructurada ha estat estudiada extensament en models monolingües de llenguatges pré-entrenats i encara no ha estat completament evaluada amb els seus homologues multilingües. Aquesta feina investiga tres aspectes de la pruning estructurada en models multilingües de llenguatges pré-entrenats: configuracions, algoritmes i eficiència. Els experiments en nou tasques avall mostran diversos fenomens contraintuïtius: per a les configuracions, la pruning individual per cada llengua no provoca millor resultat; per als algoritmes, el mètode més senzill fa el millor; per a l'eficiència, un model ràpid no implica que també sigui petit. Per facilitar la comparació a tots els nivells d'escassetat, presentem la Sparsificació Dinàmica, un enfocament senzill que permet treinar el model una vegada i adaptar-se a diferents dimensions de model a la inferència. Esperem que aquest treball ompli la diferència en l'estudi de pruning estructurat en models multilingües pré-entrenats i llum sobre la futura investigació.", 'bs': 'Strukturirano obrazovanje se široko proučavalo na monojezičkim predobučenim jezičkim modelima, a još uvijek se potpuno procjenjuje na njihovim multijezičkim kolegama. Ovaj rad istražuje tri aspekta strukturiranog pružanja na multijezičkim predobučenim jezičkim modelima: postavke, algoritme i efikasnost. Eksperimenti na devet nedaleko zadataka pokazuju nekoliko antiintuitivnih fenomena: za postavke, individualno pružanje za svaki jezik ne inducira bolji rezultat; za algoritme, najjednostavniji metod izvršava najbolje; za učinkovitost, brz model ne znači da je i mali. Da bi olakšali usporedbu na svim nivoima sparsiteta, predstavljamo dinamičku sparsifikaciju, jednostavan pristup koji omogućava treniranje model a jednom i prilagođenje različitim veličinama modela na infekciji. Nadamo se da će ovaj rad ispuniti prazninu u istraživanju strukturiranog pružanja na multijezičkim predobučenim modelima i proširi svjetlo budućim istraživanjima.', 'cs': 'Strukturované řezání bylo rozsáhlě studováno na jednojjazyčných předškolených jazykových modelech a ještě není plně vyhodnoceno na jejich vícejazyčných protějšcích. Tato práce zkoumá tři aspekty strukturovaného řezání na vícejazyčných předškolených jazykových modelech: nastavení, algoritmy a efektivitu. Experimenty na devíti následných úlohách ukazují několik protiintuitivních jevů: u nastavení individuální řezání pro každý jazyk nevyvolává lepší výsledek; u algoritmů nejjednodušší metoda provádí nejlepší; z hlediska efektivity rychlý model neznamená, že je také malý. Pro usnadnění srovnání na všech úrovních řídkosti představujeme Dynamická Sparsifikace, jednoduchý přístup, který umožňuje jednou trénovat model a přizpůsobit se různým velikostem modelu při závěru. Doufáme, že tato práce vyplní mezeru ve studiu strukturovaného řezání na vícejazyčných předškolených modelech a vrhne světlo na budoucí výzkum.', 'et': 'Struktureeritud pügamist on põhjalikult uuritud ühekeelsete eelõpetatud keelemudelite põhjal ja seda ei ole veel täielikult hinnatud mitmekeelsete kolleegide puhul. Käesolevas töös uuritakse mitmekeelsete eelõpetatud keelemudelite struktureeritud pügamise kolme aspekti: seadistused, algoritmid ja efektiivsus. Üheksa järgmise etapi ülesandega tehtud katsed näitavad mitmeid vastupidiseid nähtusi: seadete puhul ei anna iga keele individuaalne lõikamine paremat tulemust; algoritmide puhul on kõige lihtsam meetod parim; tõhususe osas ei tähenda kiire mudel, et see on ka väike. Kõigi hõreduse tasemete võrdlemise hõlbustamiseks tutvustame lihtsat lähenemisviisi Dynamic Sparsification, mis võimaldab mudelit ühekordselt treenida ja kohandada erinevate mudeli suurustega järeldusel. Loodame, et see töö täidab lünga struktureeritud pügamise uuringus mitmekeelsete eelkoolitud mudelite alusel ja valgustab tulevasi uuringuid.', 'fi': 'Rakenteellista karsintaa on tutkittu laajasti yksikielisissä esikoulutetuissa kielimalleissa, ja monikielisistä malleista ei ole vielä täysin arvioitu. Tässä työssä tutkitaan kolmea jäsenneltyä karsimista monikielisissä esikoulutetuissa kielimalleissa: asetuksia, algoritmeja ja tehokkuutta. Yhdeksän loppupään tehtävän kokeet osoittavat useita vastaintuitiivisia ilmiöitä: asetuksissa yksittäisen karsinnan kutakin kieltä varten ei saada aikaan parempaa tulosta. algoritmien osalta yksinkertaisin menetelmä toimii parhaiten; Tehokkuuden kannalta nopea malli ei tarkoita, että se olisi myös pieni. Vertailun helpottamiseksi kaikilla sparsiteettitasoilla esittelemme dynaamisen sparsifikaation, yksinkertaisen lähestymistavan, joka mahdollistaa mallin harjoittelun kerran ja mukautumisen eri mallikokoihin päättelyn yhteydessä. Toivomme, että tämä työ täyttää aukon jäsennellyn karsinnan tutkimuksessa monikielisten esikoulutettujen mallien avulla ja valaisee tulevaa tutkimusta.', 'jv': 'Dijejer-jejer Workspace %d Perintah sing paling dong task sing gawe barang pengguna-pengguna sing gawe Perintah iso nggawe barang pengguna: kanggo pengaturan, sapa-sapa uwong nggawe barang langga ora bisa adalah sing luwih apik; sampeyan Algorithm njaluk-njaluk, model sing wis mbut ora bisa ngono kuwi mpeg. Ditambalo perusahaan kelangan sampeyan ngono kuwi sawasar kelangan anyar, kita ngubah Dinamarik Sparsiification, supaya sampeyan sing perusahaan nggawe modèl sapa-sapa ngono iki sakjane sampeyan kanggo ngerasar model sing wis dipun Awak dhéwé nglanggar kuwi nglanggar kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngilanggar aturan neng sampek bantuan ingkang sampek bantuan ingkang sampek.', 'he': 'ניתוח מובנה נלמד באופן רחב על דוגמני שפת מואמנים מונושפתיים מראש ועדיין לא ניתן להעריך באופן מלא על שותפיהם הרב-שפתיים. העבודה הזו חוקרת שלושה היבטים של שיקוי מובנה על דוגמני שפת מואמנים מראש רבות שפות: הסדרות, אלגוריתמים, ויעילות. ניסויים על תשעה משימות למטה מראים מספר תופעות נגד אינטואיטיביות: עבור הסדרות, טיפול בודד לכל שפה לא מעורר תוצאה טובה יותר; לאלגוריטמים, השיטה הפשוטה ביותר מבצעת את הטוב ביותר; עבור יעילות, מודל מהיר לא מרמז שהוא גם קטן. כדי להקל את השוואה בכל רמות הידרות, אנו מציגים שידרוך דינמי, גישה פשוטה שמאפשרת לאימון את המודל פעם אחת ומסתגל לגודלים שונים במסקנה. אנו מקווים שהעבודה הזאת ממלא את הפער במחקר של שיקוי מבנה על דוגמנים רבים שפותיים מאומנים מראש ומציא אור על מחקר עתיד.', 'sk': 'Strukturirano obrezovanje je bilo obsežno raziskano na enojezičnih predhodno usposobljenih jezikovnih modelih in še ni v celoti ocenjeno glede na njihove večjezične kolege. V delu so raziskani trije vidiki strukturiranega obrezovanja na večjezičnih predhodno usposobljenih jezikovnih modelih: nastavitve, algoritmi in učinkovitost. Poskusi pri devetih nadaljnjih nalogah kažejo več protiutuativnih pojavov: pri nastavitvah posamezno obrezovanje za vsak jezik ne prinaša boljšega rezultata; za algoritme je najpreprostejša metoda najboljša; Za učinkovitost hiter model ne pomeni, da je tudi majhen. Da bi olajšali primerjavo na vseh nivojih redkosti, predstavljamo dinamično spartsifikacijo, preprost pristop, ki omogoča usposabljanje modela enkrat in prilagajanje različnim velikostim modela ob sklepanju. Upamo, da to delo zapolni vrzel v študiji strukturiranega obrezovanja na večjezičnih vnaprej usposobljenih modelih in osvetli prihodnje raziskave.', 'ha': "Structured pruning has been extensively studied on monolingual pre-trained language models and is yet to be fully evaluated on their multilingual counterparts.  Wannan aikin yana tambaya sau biyu na bakin da aka samu da kafin-mulki-harshe: daidaita, algoritm, da fassara. Kayan jarrabai kan aikin na guda na ƙarami yana nuna wasu abu mai motsi-masu motsi: wa daidaita, mai gyara wa kowace harshen bai ƙara wani mafi alhẽri ba; domin algoritm, hanyoyin sauri na sami mafi kyãwo; Ga fani, misalin haraka bã ya amfani da kasa ƙarami. Yana amfani da kwamfyuta ga sami ga duk daraja na tsumarni, tuna yanzu tsumarni na Dũniyar, wata hanyoyi mai sauƙi wanda ke yarda da yin amfani da misalin kwamfyuta, a lokacin da za'a yi adadi ga girma na misãlai daban-dabam. Tuna fatan wannan aikin ya cika gaɓa a cikin littafin da aka samar da shi na samun misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman mulki-harshen na'ura kuma ya nuna haske a kan littafan nan gaba.", 'bo': 'Structured pruning has been extensively studied on monolingual pre-trained language models and is yet to be fully evaluated on their multilingual counterparts. ལས་ཀ་འདིས་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ནང་དོན་ཚན་གསུམ་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།སྒྲིག་སྟངས། སྒྲིག འོག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་འགྲམ་དུ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟ་བུ་ཚོས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་འཆར་བྱེད། སྒྲིག་སྟངས སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྐྱོན་མོ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན། སྤྱིར་བཏུབ་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིག་ནི་དེ་ཆུང་ཀུ་ཡིན་མེད་པར། To facilitate the comparison on all sparsity levels, we present Dynamic Sparsification, a simple approach that allows training the model once and adapt to different models sizes at inference. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པའི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་སྟོང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་རྒྱུ་རེད་ལ།'}
{'en': 'Can Unsupervised Knowledge Transfer from Social Discussions Help Argument Mining', 'ar': 'GPT-D: إحداث التشوهات اللغوية المتعلقة بالخرف عن طريق التدهور المتعمد لنماذج اللغة العصبية الاصطناعية', 'es': 'GPT-D: Inducción de anomalías lingüísticas relacionadas con la demencia mediante la degradación deliberada de modelos de lenguaje neuronal artificial', 'fr': "GPT-D\xa0: Induction d'anomalies linguistiques liées à la démence par dégradation délibérée de modèles de langage neuronal artificiels", 'pt': 'GPT-D: Induzindo Anomalias Linguísticas Relacionadas à Demência por Degradação Deliberada de Modelos de Linguagem Neural Artificial', 'ja': 'GPT - D ：人工神経言語モデルの故意の劣化による認知症関連言語異常の誘発', 'hi': 'जीपीटी-डी: कृत्रिम तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल के जानबूझकर गिरावट द्वारा मनोभ्रंश से संबंधित भाषाई विसंगतियों को प्रेरित करना', 'zh': 'GPT-D曰:退化人工神经语诱痴呆症异也', 'ru': 'GPT-D: Индуцирование лингвистических аномалий, связанных с деменцией, путем преднамеренной деградации моделей искусственного нейронного языка', 'ga': 'GPT-D: Aimhrialtachtaí Teangacha a Bhaineann le Néaltrú a Spreagadh Trí Mhúnlaí Saorga Teangacha Néaracha a Dhíghrádú d’aon ghnó', 'ka': 'GPT', 'hu': 'GPT-D: Demenciával összefüggő nyelvi anomáliák előidézése mesterséges neurális nyelvmodellek szándékos romlásával', 'el': 'Προκαλεί γλωσσικές ανωμαλίες που σχετίζονται με την άνοια με τη σκόπιμη υποβάθμιση μοντέλων τεχνητής νευρωνικής γλώσσας', 'it': 'GPT-D: Induzione di anomalie linguistiche legate alla demenza mediante degradazione deliberata dei modelli linguistici neurali artificiali', 'kk': 'GPT', 'mk': 'ГПТ-Д: Индуцирање на јазични аномалии поврзани со деменција со намерна деградација на уметничките неурални јазички модели', 'lt': 'GPT-D: su demencija susijusių kalbinių anomalijų sukelti tyčiniu dirbtinių nervinių kalbų modelių blogėjimu', 'ml': 'ജിപിടി- ഡി: ഡെമെന്റിയയുടെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക് ആനോമാലികള്\u200d ഡെലിബെറേറ്റ് ഡിഗ്രാഗ്രാഡേഷന്\u200d ആന്\u200dഡിഫിക്കല', 'mt': 'GPT-D: L-Induzzjoni ta’ Anomaliji Lingwistiċi relatati mad-Demenzja permezz ta’ Degradazzjoni Deliberata ta’ Mudelli tal-Lingwi Newrali Artifikali', 'ms': 'GPT-D: Meminduksi Anomali Bahasa yang berkaitan dengan Demensia oleh Degradasi Sengaja Model Bahasa Neural Artificial', 'mn': 'GPT', 'no': 'GPT', 'pl': 'GPT-D: Wywoływanie anomalii językowych związanych z demencją poprzez celową degradację modeli sztucznego języka neuronowego', 'si': 'GPT', 'ro': 'GPT-D: Inducerea anomaliilor lingvistice legate de demenţă prin degradarea deliberată a modelelor de limbaj neural artificial', 'sr': 'GPT-D: Ucinjavanje Lingvističkih Anomalija povezanih sa Dementijom deliberatim Degradacijom umjetnih neuroloških modela', 'sv': 'GPT-D: Att framkalla demensrelaterade språkliga anomalier genom avsiktlig nedbrytning av artificiella neurala språkmodeller', 'so': 'GPT-D: Inducing Dementia related Linguistic Anomalies by Deliberate Degradation of Artificial Neural Models', 'ur': 'جی پی ٹی ڈی: مجموعہ نیورال زبان موڈل کے ڈیلیبراٹ ڈیگریٹ کے ذریعہ دھوکا دینے کے ذریعہ Dementia-related Linguistic Anomalies', 'ta': 'GPT- D: தொடர்புடைய தொடர்புடைய தொடர்புடைய Linguistic Anomalies by Deliberate Degradation of Artificial Neural Language Models', 'uz': 'GPT-D: Name', 'vi': 'GPT-D: D ẫn đầu các ngôn ngữ học có liên quan tới rối loạn', 'bg': 'Проучване на лингвистични аномалии, свързани с деменцията, чрез умишлено деградиране на изкуствени неврални езикови модели', 'nl': 'GPT-D: Het induceren van dementiegerelateerde taalanomalieën door opzettelijke degradatie van kunstmatige neurale taalmodellen', 'hr': 'GPT-D: Ucinjavanje Lingvističkih Anomalija povezanih s Dementijom s deliberatnim Degradacijom umjetnih neuronskih modela', 'da': 'GPT-D: Fremkaldelse af demensrelaterede sproglige anomalier ved bevidst nedbrydning af kunstige neurale sprogmodeller', 'de': 'GPT-D: Induzieren von demenzbedingten sprachlichen Anomalien durch gezielte Degradation künstlicher neuronaler Sprachmodelle', 'ko': 'GPT-D: 인공신경 언어모형을 고의로 분해하여 치매 관련 언어이상을 유발', 'id': 'GPT-D: Meminduksi Anomali Linguistik berkaitan dengan Demensia oleh Degradasi Deliberate of Artificial Neural Language Models', 'fa': 'GPT', 'sw': 'GPT', 'af': 'GPT', 'am': 'GPT-D:', 'sq': 'GPT-D: Inducing Dementia-related Linguistic Anomalies by Deliberate Degradation of Artificial Neural Language Models', 'hy': 'GPT-D. Դեմենցիայի հետ կապված լեզվային անոմալիաներ արտադրելով արվեստական նյարդային լեզվի մոդելների դառնալու կործանման միջոցով', 'bn': 'জিপিটি-ডি: ডেলিবেরেটের ডিগ্রেশন অফ আর্টিফিকেল নিউরাল ভাষা মডেল', 'az': 'GPT', 'ca': 'GPT-D: Inducir anomalies lingüístiques relacionades amb la demencia per degradar deliberadament els models de llenguatge neural artificial', 'bs': 'GPT-D: Ucinjavanje Lingističkih Anomalija povezanih sa Dementijom deliberatim Degradacijom umjetnih neuronskih modela', 'cs': 'GPT-D: Indukce jazykových anomálií souvisejících s demencí úmyslnou degradací modelů umělého neuronového jazyka', 'et': 'GPT-D: Dementsusega seotud keeleliste anomaaliate tekitamine kunstlike neurokeelemudelite tahtliku lagunemise teel', 'fi': 'GPT-D: Dementiaan liittyvien kielellisten anomalien indusoiminen keinotekoisten hermokielimallien tahallisella hajoamisella', 'tr': 'GPT-D: Nähili Neural Diller', 'jv': 'GLPT-D: Ngubah Desentia-barang Linguistik Anamalies Per Delibrate DeGradation of Artidical Neral Language Modes', 'sk': 'GPT-D: Povzročanje z demenco povezanih jezikovnih anomalij z namerno razgradnjo umetnih živčnih jezikovnih modelov', 'ha': 'GPT-D: Ana Inducing Degraation of some Neural language', 'he': 'GPT-D: להדליק Anomalies Linguistic Related to Dementia by Deliberate Degradation of Artificial Neural Language Models', 'bo': 'GPT-D: Inducing Dementia-related Linguistic Anomalies by Deliberate Degradation of Artificial Neural Language Models'}
{'en': 'Identifying argument components from unstructured texts and predicting the relationships expressed among them are two primary steps of argument mining The intrinsic complexity of these tasks demands powerful learning models While pretrained Transformer based Language Models LM have been shown to provide state of the art results over different NLP tasks the scarcity of manually annotated data and the highly domain dependent nature of argumentation restrict the capabilities of such models In this work we propose a novel transfer learning strategy to overcome these challenges We utilize argumentation rich social discussions from the   subreddit as a source of unsupervised argumentative discourse aware knowledge by finetuning pretrained LMs on a selectively masked language modeling task Furthermore we introduce a novel prompt based strategy for inter component relation prediction that compliments our proposed finetuning method while leveraging on the discourse context Exhaustive experiments show the generalization capability of our method on these two tasks over within domain as well as out of domain datasets outperforming several existing and employed strong baselinesChangeMyView subreddit as a source of unsupervised, argumentative discourse-aware knowledge by finetuning pretrained LMs on a selectively masked language modeling task. Furthermore, we introduce a novel prompt-based strategy for inter-component relation prediction that compliments our proposed finetuning method while leveraging on the discourse context. Exhaustive experiments show the generalization capability of our method on these two tasks over within-domain as well as out-of-domain datasets, outperforming several existing and employed strong baselines.', 'ar': 'قدمت تقنيات التعلم العميق (DL) التي تتضمن ضبط عدد كبير من معلمات النموذج أداءً رائعًا في مهمة التمييز بين اللغة التي ينتجها الأفراد الأصحاء الإدراكيون ، والذين يعانون من مرض الزهايمر (AD). ومع ذلك ، تظل الأسئلة حول قدرتها على التعميم خارج مجموعات المراجع الصغيرة المتاحة للجمهور للبحث. كبديل لتركيب معلمات النموذج بشكل مباشر ، نقترح طريقة جديدة يتم من خلالها إقران نموذج Transformer DL (GPT-2) الذي تم تدريبه مسبقًا على النص الإنجليزي العام بنسخة متدهورة بشكل مصطنع من نفسه (GPT-D) ، لحساب النسبة بين {textit {perplexities} هذين النموذجين على اللغة من الأفراد الأصحاء الإدراكيين والمعاقين. تقترب هذه التقنية من أحدث أداء على البيانات النصية من مهمة وصف صورة "سرقة ملفات تعريف الارتباط" المستخدمة على نطاق واسع ، وعلى عكس البدائل المعمول بها أيضًا بشكل جيد للمحادثات التلقائية. علاوة على ذلك ، يُنشئ GPT-D نصًا بخصائص معروفة بأنها مرتبطة بمرض الزهايمر ، مما يدل على تحريض الشذوذ اللغوي المرتبط بالخرف. تعد دراستنا خطوة نحو فهم أفضل للعلاقات بين الأعمال الداخلية لنماذج اللغة العصبية التوليدية ، واللغة التي تنتجها ، والآثار الضارة للخرف على الكلام البشري وخصائص اللغة.', 'fr': "Les techniques d'apprentissage profond (DL) impliquant le réglage fin d'un grand nombre de paramètres de modèle ont permis d'obtenir des performances impressionnantes dans la distinction entre le langage produit par des individus en bonne santé cognitive et ceux atteints de la maladie d'Alzheimer (MA). Cependant, des questions subsistent quant à leur capacité à généraliser au-delà des petits ensembles de référence accessibles au public pour la recherche. Comme alternative à l'ajustement direct des paramètres du modèle, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode par laquelle un modèle Transformer DL (GPT-2) pré-entraîné sur du texte anglais général est associé à une version artificiellement dégradée de lui-même (GPT-D), pour calculer le rapport entre les\xa0\\ textit {perplexités} de ces deux modèles sur la langue à partir de personnes en bonne santé cognitive et déficientes. Cette technique se rapproche des performances de pointe sur les données textuelles issues d'une tâche de description d'image «\xa0Cookie Theft\xa0» largement utilisée, et contrairement aux alternatives établies, elle se généralise également bien aux conversations spontanées. De plus, la GPT-D génère un texte dont les caractéristiques sont connues pour être associées à la MA, démontrant ainsi l'induction d'anomalies linguistiques liées à la démence. Notre étude est une étape vers une meilleure compréhension des relations entre le fonctionnement interne des modèles de langage neuronal génératif, le langage qu'ils produisent et les effets délétères de la démence sur les caractéristiques de la parole et du langage chez l'homme.", 'es': 'Las técnicas de aprendizaje profundo (DL) que implican ajustar un gran número de parámetros del modelo han proporcionado un rendimiento impresionante en la tarea de discriminar entre el lenguaje producido por personas cognitivamente sanas y las personas con enfermedad de Alzheimer (EA). Sin embargo, quedan dudas sobre su capacidad de generalizar más allá de los pequeños conjuntos de referencias que están disponibles públicamente para la investigación. Como alternativa al ajuste directo de los parámetros del modelo, proponemos un método novedoso mediante el cual un modelo Transformer DL (GPT-2) previamente entrenado en texto inglés general se empareja con una versión degradada artificialmente de sí mismo (GPT-D), para calcular la relación entre el\\ textit {perplexities} de estos dos modelos en el lenguaje de personas cognitivamente sanas y con problemas de salud. Esta técnica se acerca al rendimiento de vanguardia en datos de texto de una tarea de descripción de imágenes de «Robo de cookies» ampliamente utilizada y, a diferencia de las alternativas establecidas, también generaliza bien las conversaciones espontáneas. Además, la GPT-D genera texto con características que se sabe que están asociadas con la EA, lo que demuestra la inducción de anomalías lingüísticas relacionadas con la demencia. Nuestro estudio es un paso hacia una mejor comprensión de las relaciones entre el funcionamiento interno de los modelos de lenguaje neuronal generativo, el lenguaje que producen y los efectos deletéreos de la demencia en las características del habla y el lenguaje humanos.', 'pt': 'Técnicas de aprendizado profundo (DL) que envolvem o ajuste fino de um grande número de parâmetros do modelo apresentaram um desempenho impressionante na tarefa de discriminar entre a linguagem produzida por indivíduos cognitivamente saudáveis e aqueles com doença de Alzheimer (DA). No entanto, permanecem questões sobre sua capacidade de generalizar além dos pequenos conjuntos de referência que estão publicamente disponíveis para pesquisa. Como alternativa para ajustar os parâmetros do modelo diretamente, propomos um novo método pelo qual um modelo Transformer DL (GPT-2) pré-treinado em texto em inglês geral é emparelhado com uma versão degradada artificialmente de si mesmo (GPT-D), para calcular o relação entre as \\textit{perplexidades} desses dois modelos na linguagem de indivíduos cognitivamente saudáveis e deficientes. Essa técnica aborda o desempenho de última geração em dados de texto de uma tarefa de descrição de imagem amplamente usada "Roubo de cookies" e, ao contrário das alternativas estabelecidas, também generaliza bem para conversas espontâneas. Além disso, o GPT-D gera texto com características sabidamente associadas à DA, demonstrando a indução de anomalias linguísticas relacionadas à demência. Nosso estudo é um passo para uma melhor compreensão das relações entre o funcionamento interno dos modelos generativos de linguagem neural, a linguagem que eles produzem e os efeitos deletérios da demência na fala humana e nas características da linguagem.', 'zh': '凡参数之深学(DL)分别知健个体言语阿尔茨海默病(AD)言事有深能。 然其越公论小参考集犹有疑焉。 直拟合模参数者代之,立新法,因其方,先英语文本Transformer DL(GPT-2)与人为降版(GPT-D)配对,以计二者之\\textit{困惑}与知康损个体言语之率。 近乎Cookie盗窃图片述其文数之最新,而异乎已立之代,亦善推而对之。 又GPT-D文本有知AD之征,明诱痴语也。 吾道向善解神经语言内运,其言痴呆症人之害也。', 'hi': 'डीप लर्निंग (डीएल) तकनीकों में बड़ी संख्या में मॉडल पैरामीटर शामिल हैं, जिन्होंने संज्ञानात्मक रूप से स्वस्थ व्यक्तियों द्वारा उत्पादित भाषा और अल्जाइमर रोग (एडी) वाले लोगों के बीच भेदभाव करने के कार्य पर प्रभावशाली प्रदर्शन किया है। हालांकि, प्रश्न छोटे संदर्भ सेटों से परे सामान्यीकरण करने की उनकी क्षमता के बारे में रहते हैं जो अनुसंधान के लिए सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध हैं। सीधे मॉडल पैरामीटर को फिट करने के विकल्प के रूप में, हम एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसके द्वारा सामान्य अंग्रेजी पाठ पर एक ट्रांसफॉर्मर डीएल मॉडल (जीपीटी -2) पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित को स्वयं के कृत्रिम रूप से अवक्रमित संस्करण (जीपीटी-डी) के साथ जोड़ा जाता है, ताकि संज्ञानात्मक रूप से स्वस्थ और बिगड़ा हुआ व्यक्तियों से भाषा पर इन दो मॉडलों के बीच के अनुपात की गणना की जा सके। यह तकनीक व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले "कुकी चोरी" चित्र विवरण कार्य से पाठ डेटा पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन तक पहुंचती है, और स्थापित विकल्पों के विपरीत भी सहज बातचीत के लिए अच्छी तरह से सामान्यीकृत होती है। इसके अलावा, जीपीटी-डी एडी से जुड़ी विशेषताओं के साथ पाठ उत्पन्न करता है, जो मनोभ्रंश से संबंधित भाषाई विसंगतियों के प्रेरण का प्रदर्शन करता है। हमारा अध्ययन जननात्मक तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल के आंतरिक कामकाज, उनके द्वारा उत्पादित भाषा, और मानव भाषण और भाषा विशेषताओं पर मनोभ्रंश के हानिकारक प्रभावों के बीच संबंधों की बेहतर समझ की दिशा में एक कदम है।', 'ru': 'Методы глубокого обучения (DL), включающие точную настройку большого количества параметров модели, дали впечатляющие результаты при выполнении задачи по различению языка, производимого когнитивно здоровыми людьми, и тех, кто страдает болезнью Альцгеймера (AD). Однако остаются вопросы относительно их способности обобщать, выходя за рамки небольших контрольных наборов, которые являются общедоступными для исследований. В качестве альтернативы непосредственной подгонке параметров модели, мы предлагаем новый метод, с помощью которого модель DL Трансформатора (GPT-2), предварительно обученная общему английскому тексту, спаривается с искусственно деградированной версией себя (GPT-D), чтобы вычислить соотношение между этими двумя моделями\\textit{недоумения} на языке от когнитивно здоровых и ослабленных индивидуумов. Этот метод подходит к современной производительности текстовых данных из широко используемой задачи описания картинки «Кража cookie», и в отличие от установленных альтернатив также хорошо обобщает спонтанные разговоры. Кроме того, GPT-D генерирует текст с характеристиками, которые, как известно, связаны с БА, демонстрируя индукцию лингвистических аномалий, связанных с деменцией. Наше исследование является шагом к лучшему пониманию взаимосвязей между внутренними работами генеративных нейронных языковых моделей, языком, который они производят, и пагубным воздействием деменции на речевые и языковые характеристики человека.', 'ja': '多数のモデルパラメータを微調整するディープラーニング（ DL ）テクニックは、認知的に健康な個人によって生成された言語とアルツハイマー病（ AD ）の個人によって生成された言語を区別するタスクで印象的なパフォーマンスを提供してきました。 しかし、研究のために公開されている小さなリファレンスセットを超えて一般化する能力については疑問が残る。 モデルパラメータを直接フィッティングする代わりに、一般的な英語テキストで事前にトレーニングされたトランスフォーマーDLモデル（ GPT -2 ）を人工的に分解されたバージョンのそれ自体（ GPT - D ）とペアにして、認知的に健康で障害のある個人から言語におけるこれら2つのモデルの間の比率を計算する新規の方法を提案します。 この手法は、広く使用されている「Cookie盗難」の画像記述タスクからテキストデータの最先端のパフォーマンスにアプローチし、確立された代替案とは異なり、自発的な会話にもよく一般化します。 さらに、ＧＰＴ － Ｄは、ＡＤと関連することが知られている特徴を有するテキストを生成し、認知症関連の言語異常の誘導を実証する。 私たちの研究は、生成神経言語モデルの内面的な働き、それらが生成する言語、および認知症が人間の発話と言語特性に与える有害な影響をよりよく理解するためのステップです。', 'ga': "D'éirigh go hiontach le teicníochtaí domhainfhoghlama (DL) a bhaineann le mionchoigeartú líon mór de pharaiméadair samhlacha ar an tasc chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir teanga a tháirgeann daoine aonair atá sláintiúil go cognaíoch, agus iad siúd a bhfuil galar Alzheimer orthu (AD). Mar sin féin, tá ceisteanna fós ann faoina gcumas ginearálú thar na tacair tagartha bheaga atá ar fáil go poiblí le haghaidh taighde. Mar mhalairt ar pharaiméadair na samhla a fheistiú go díreach, molaimid modh nua trína ndéantar samhail Trasfhoirmeoir DL (GPT-2) réamh-oilte ar théacs ginearálta Béarla a phéireáil le leagan díghrádaithe go saorga de féin (GPT-D), chun an cóimheas idir an dá mhúnla seo ' \\textit{perplexities} ar theanga ó dhaoine aonair atá sláintiúil go cognaíoch agus a bhfuil lagú orthu. Téann an teicníocht seo i ngleic le feidhmíocht úrscothach ar shonraí téacs ó thasc cur síos pictiúr “Goid Fianán” a úsáidtear go forleathan, agus murab ionann agus roghanna seanbhunaithe ginearálaithe go maith freisin do chomhráite spontáineacha. Ina theannta sin, gineann GPT-D téacs arb eol go bhfuil baint aige le AD, rud a thaispeánann ionduchtú aimhrialtachtaí teanga a bhaineann le néaltrú. Is céim é ár staidéar i dtreo tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar na caidrimh idir oibriú inmheánach samhlacha néartheanga giniúna, an teanga a tháirgeann siad, agus éifeachtaí díobhálacha an néaltraithe ar chaint an duine agus ar shaintréithe teanga.", 'hu': 'Nagy számú modellparaméter finomhangolását magában foglaló mélytanulási (DL) technikák lenyűgöző teljesítményt nyújtottak a kognitívan egészséges egyének és az Alzheimer-kórban szenvedők közötti megkülönböztetés feladatában. Ugyanakkor továbbra is kérdések vannak arról, hogy képesek-e általánosítani azon kis referenciakészleteken túl, amelyek nyilvánosan hozzáférhetők a kutatáshoz. A modellparaméterek közvetlen illesztésének alternatívájaként egy új módszert javasolunk, amelynek segítségével egy általános angol szövegre előkészített Transformer DL modellt (GPT-2) párosítunk önmagának mesterségesen lebomlott változatával (GPT-D), hogy kiszámítsuk a két modell \\textit{perplexities} közötti arányt a kognitívan egészséges és károsodott egyének nyelvére vonatkozóan. Ez a technika megközelíti a szöveges adatok korszerű teljesítményét egy széles körben használt "Cookie Lopás" képleírási feladatból, és a meglévő alternatívákkal ellentétben a spontán beszélgetésekre is jól általánosítja. Továbbá a GPT-D olyan szövegeket hoz létre, amelyek ismert, hogy összefüggésben vannak AD-vel, bizonyítva a demenciával összefüggő nyelvi anomáliák kialakulását. Tanulmányunk lépést jelent a generációs neurális nyelvmodellek belső működésének, az általuk előállított nyelvnek, valamint a demencia emberi beszédre és nyelvjellemzőkre gyakorolt káros hatásainak jobb megértése felé.', 'el': 'Οι τεχνικές βαθιάς μάθησης που περιλαμβάνουν τον συντονισμό μεγάλου αριθμού παραμέτρων μοντέλου έχουν επιτύχει εντυπωσιακές επιδόσεις στο έργο της διάκρισης μεταξύ γλώσσας που παράγεται από γνωστικά υγιή άτομα και εκείνων με νόσο Αλτσχάιμερ (AD). Ωστόσο, παραμένουν ερωτήματα σχετικά με την ικανότητά τους να γενικεύουν πέρα από τα μικρά σύνολα αναφοράς που είναι δημόσια διαθέσιμα για έρευνα. Ως εναλλακτική λύση της άμεσης προσαρμογής παραμέτρων μοντέλου, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο με την οποία ένα μοντέλο μετασχηματιστή προ-εκπαιδευμένο σε γενικό αγγλικό κείμενο συνδυάζεται με μια τεχνητά υποβαθμισμένη έκδοση του εαυτού του (για να υπολογίσουμε την αναλογία μεταξύ αυτών των δύο μοντέλων στη γλώσσα από γνωστικά υγιή και μειωμένα άτομα. Αυτή η τεχνική προσεγγίζει την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση σε δεδομένα κειμένου από μια ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενη εργασία περιγραφής εικόνας "Κλοπή μπισκότων", και σε αντίθεση με τις καθιερωμένες εναλλακτικές λύσεις γενικεύει επίσης καλά σε αυθόρμητες συζητήσεις. Επιπλέον, η GPT-D παράγει κείμενο με χαρακτηριστικά γνωστά ότι σχετίζονται με την AD, καταδεικνύοντας την πρόκληση γλωσσικών ανωμαλιών που σχετίζονται με άνοια. Η μελέτη μας είναι ένα βήμα προς την καλύτερη κατανόηση των σχέσεων μεταξύ της εσωτερικής λειτουργίας των γενεαλογικών μοντέλων νευρωνικής γλώσσας, της γλώσσας που παράγουν και των επιβλαβών επιπτώσεων της άνοιας στα χαρακτηριστικά της ανθρώπινης ομιλίας και γλώσσας.', 'it': 'Le tecniche di deep learning (DL) che prevedono la messa a punto di un gran numero di parametri di modello hanno fornito prestazioni impressionanti sul compito di discriminare tra il linguaggio prodotto da individui cognitivamente sani e quelli con malattia di Alzheimer (AD). Tuttavia, rimangono interrogativi sulla loro capacità di generalizzare oltre i piccoli set di riferimento che sono pubblicamente disponibili per la ricerca. In alternativa all\'adattamento diretto dei parametri del modello, proponiamo un nuovo metodo attraverso il quale un modello Transformer DL (GPT-2) pre-addestrato sul testo inglese generale è abbinato ad una versione artificialmente degradata di se stessa (GPT-D), per calcolare il rapporto tra questi due modelli \\textit{perplessities} sul linguaggio di individui cognitivamente sani e alterati. Questa tecnica si avvicina alle prestazioni all\'avanguardia sui dati di testo provenienti da un\'attività di descrizione dell\'immagine ampiamente utilizzata "Cookie Theft", e a differenza delle alternative consolidate si generalizza bene anche alle conversazioni spontanee. Inoltre, GPT-D genera testo con caratteristiche note per essere associate ad AD, dimostrando l\'induzione di anomalie linguistiche legate alla demenza. Il nostro studio è un passo verso una migliore comprensione delle relazioni tra il funzionamento interno dei modelli di linguaggio neurale generativo, il linguaggio che producono e gli effetti deleteri della demenza sul linguaggio umano e sulle caratteristiche del linguaggio.', 'ka': "დიდი მოდელური პარამეტრების განსწავლების (DL) ტექნეკები, რომლებიც დიდი მოდელური პარამეტრების განსხვავებას შემდეგ ინტერესტიური გამოყენება ენის განსხვავებაში, რომლებიც კონციგურად ჯანმრთელი ადამიანებ მაგრამ კითხვები არსებობენ მათი შესაძლებლობაზე, რომელიც სახელსაწყისთვის სახელსაწყისთვის შესაძლებლობა დავიწყება პატარა რეფერენციის კონტე როგორც ალტენტიფიკაცია მოდელური პარამეტრების განმავლობისთვის, ჩვენ პროგრამეტს პროგრამის გამოყენება, რომელიც საერთო ანგლისური ტექსტის განმავლობაში ტრანფორმეტრი DL მოდელი (GPT-2) პროგრამეტური განმავლობაში იყო საკუთარი განმავლობაში განმავლებული ვერსია (GPT-D) თავი ეს ტექნექცია ტექსტის მონაცემების შესახებ ტექსტის მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც უფრო გამოყენებული 'Cookie Theft' სურათის გამოსახულების მონაცემების მონაცემების მონაცემების გადაწყენებ დამატებით, GPT-D იქნება ტექსტის შექმნა, რომელიც AD-თან დაკავშირებულია, რომელიც განსხვავებული ენგუმისტიკური ანომალიების ინდექცია. ჩვენი სწავლება უფრო უკეთესი გაგრძნობისთვის გრძნობების გრძნობების შესახებ, რომლებიც ისინი წარმოიქმნენ ნეიროლის მოდელეების შორის მუშაობისთვის, და დემონტიის დემონტიის ეფე", 'lt': 'Didelio mokymosi (DL) metodai, apimantys didelio modelio parametrų skaičiaus tikslinimą, sukėlė įspūdingų rezultatų siekiant diskriminuoti pažintingai sveikų asmenų ir Alzheimerio liga sergančių asmenų pagamintą kalbą. Vis dėlto lieka klausimų apie jų gebėjimą apskritai išplėsti daugiau nei maži orientaciniai rinkiniai, kurie yra viešai prieinami moksliniams tyrimams. Kaip alternatyva tiesiogiai pritaikyti modelio parametrus, siūlome naują metodą, kuriuo iš anksto parengtas Transformer DL model is (GPT-2) bendrajame anglų kalbos tekste sutampa su dirbtinai nusilpninta paties versija (GPT-D), kad būtų apskaičiuotas šių dviejų modelių \\textit{perplexities} santykis su pažinimo sveikų ir sutrikusių asmenų kalba. Šiuo metodu art ėjama prie naujausių teksto duomenų, gautų iš plačiai naudojamos "Cookie Theft" vaizdo aprašymo užduoties, rezultatų, o kitaip nei nustatytos alternatyvos taip pat gerai paplito spontaniniams pokalbiams. Be to, GPT-D sukuria tekstą, kurio charakteristikos yra susijusios su AD, ir tai rodo su demencija susijusių kalbinių anomalijų indukciją. Mūsų tyrimas yra žingsnis siekiant geriau suprasti santykius tarp kartinių nervinių kalbų modelių vidinio veikimo, jų gaminamos kalbos ir neigiamo demencijos poveikio žmogaus kalbai ir kalbos savybėms.', 'mk': "Deep learning (DL) techniques involving fine-tuning large numbers of model parameters have delivered impressive performance on the task of discriminating between language produced by cognitively healthy individuals, and those with Alzheimer's disease (AD).  Сепак, остануваат прашања за нивната способност да се генерализираат надвор од малите референциски сети кои се јавно достапни за истражување. Како алтернатива за директно приспособување на параметрите на моделот, предложуваме нов метод со кој моделот Трансформер DL (GPT- 2) преобучен на генерален англиски текст е париран со вештачки деградирана верзија од себе (GPT- D), за да се пресмета односот помеѓу Оваа техника се приближува до најновите резултати на текстовите податоци од широко употребена задача за опис на сликата „кражба на колачиња“, а за разлика од воспоставени алтернативи, исто така, се генерализира добро на спонтани разговори. Покрај тоа, ГПТ-Д генерира текст со карактеристики познати како поврзани со АД, демонстрирајќи ја индукцијата на јазични аномалии поврзани со деменција. Нашата студија претставува чекор кон подобро разбирање на односите помеѓу внатрешното работење на генералните нервни јазички модели, јазикот што го произведуваат, и негативните ефекти на деменцијата на човековиот говор и јазичките карактеристики.", 'ms': "Teknik belajar dalam (DL) yang melibatkan penyesuaian nombor besar parameter model telah memberikan prestasi yang mengesankan pada tugas diskriminasi antara bahasa yang dihasilkan oleh individu yang sehat secara kognitif, dan orang-orang yang mengalami penyakit Alzheimer (AD). Namun, pertanyaan tetap tentang kemampuan mereka untuk menyebarkan melampaui set rujukan kecil yang tersedia secara umum untuk kajian. Sebagai alternatif untuk memasang parameter model secara langsung, kami cadangkan kaedah baru yang mana model DL Transformer (GPT-2) dilatih-dilatih-dilatih pada teks Inggeris umum dipasang dengan versi yang merusak secara artificial dirinya sendiri (GPT-D), untuk menghitung nisbah antara kedua-dua model '\\textit{perplexities} pada bahasa dari individu yang sihat dan cacat secara kognitif. Teknik ini mendekati prestasi state-of-the-art pada data teks dari tugas deskripsi gambar 'Pencurian Cookie' yang digunakan secara luas, dan tidak seperti alternatif yang ditetapkan juga menyebarkan dengan baik kepada perbualan spontan. Selain itu, GPT-D menghasilkan teks dengan ciri-ciri yang diketahui berkaitan dengan AD, menunjukkan induksi anomali bahasa berkaitan dengan demensi. Pelajaran kami adalah langkah untuk memahami lebih baik hubungan antara kerja dalam model bahasa saraf generasi, bahasa yang mereka hasilkan, dan kesan memadamkan demensi pada ucapan manusia dan ciri-ciri bahasa.", 'mt': "Tekniki ta’ tagħlim fil-fond (DL) li jinvolvu l-aġġustament fin ta’ għadd kbir ta’ parametri mudell wasslu għal prestazzjoni impressjonanti fuq il-kompitu ta’ diskriminazzjoni bejn il-lingwa prodotta minn individwi b’saħħithom konjittivament, u dawk bil-marda ta’ Alzheimer (AD). Madankollu, għad hemm mistoqsijiet dwar il-kapaċità tagħhom li jiġġeneralizzaw lil hinn mis-settijiet żgħar ta’ referenza li huma disponibbli pubblikament għar-riċerka. Bħala alternattiva għat-twaħħil dirett tal-parametri tal-mudell, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid li permezz tiegħu mudell DL Transformer (GPT-2) imħarreġ minn qabel fuq test ġenerali bl-Ingliż huwa pparagunat ma’ verżjoni artifiċjalment degradata minnu nnifsu (GPT-D), biex jiġi kkalkulat il-proporzjon bejn dawn iż-żewġ mudelli' \\textit{perplexities} fuq il-lingwa minn individwi b’saħħithom konjittivament u b’indeboliment. Din it-teknika tindirizza l-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata dwar id-dejta tat-test minn kompitu ta’ deskrizzjoni tal-istampa użat b’mod wiesa’ ‘serq tal-cookies’, u kuntrarju għall-alternattivi stabbiliti ġeneralizza wkoll tajjeb għal konverżjonijiet spontanji. Barra minn hekk, GPT-D jiġġenera test b’karatteristiċi magħrufa li huma assoċjati ma’ AD, li juri l-induzzjoni ta’ anomaliji lingwistiċi relatati mad-dimenzja. L-istudju tagħna huwa pass lejn fehim a ħjar tar-relazzjonijiet bejn il-ħidmiet interni tal-mudelli ġenerattivi tal-lingwa newrali, il-lingwa li jipproduċu, u l-effetti negattivi tad-dimenzja fuq id-diskors tal-bniedem u l-karatteristiċi tal-lingwa.", 'ml': "Deep learning (DL) techniques involving fine-tuning large numbers of model parameters have delivered impressive performance on the task of discriminating between language produced by cognitively healthy individuals, and those with Alzheimer's disease (AD).  എന്നാലും, പഠനത്തിന് വേണ്ടി ലഭ്യമല്ലാത്ത ചെറിയ റെഫറന്\u200dസ് സെറ്റുകള്\u200dക്ക് മുന്\u200dപ് സൃഷ്ടിക്കാനുള്ള കഴ നേരിട്ട് സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പരാമീറ്ററുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള മറ്റൊരു മാറ്റം ആയിക്കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രാദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിലൂടെ ഒരു ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dഫ് ഡിഎല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d (GPT-2) മുന്\u200dഗ്ലീഷ് ടെക്സ്റ്രെയിന്\u200dറ ഈ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയില്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ 'കുക്കി തിഫ്റ്റ്' ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ വിവരണ ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ടെക്സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ഡേറ്റാറ് അതിനുശേഷം, ജിപിടി- ഡി എഡിയോടൊപ്പം ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുമായി പദാവലിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഡെമെന്റിയയോടൊപ്പം ബന്ധിച്ച ഭാഷ നമ്മുടെ പഠനം ജനറല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉള്ളിലെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് നന്നായി മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന ഒരു പട", 'pl': 'Techniki głębokiego uczenia się (DL) obejmujące dostosowanie dużej liczby parametrów modelu przyniosły imponujące osiągnięcia w zadaniu rozróżniania języka wytwarzanego przez osoby zdrowe poznawczo, a osoby z chorobą Alzheimera (AD). Pozostają jednak pytania dotyczące ich zdolności do uogólniania poza małymi zbiorami referencyjnymi, które są publicznie dostępne do badań. Jako alternatywę dla bezpośredniego dopasowywania parametrów modelu proponujemy nową metodę, za pomocą której model Transformera DL (GPT-2) wstępnie przeszkolony na ogólnym angielskim tekście jest sparowany ze sztucznie zdegradowaną wersją siebie (GPT-D), aby obliczyć stosunek między tymi dwoma modelami\' \\textit{perplectities} na język od osób zdrowych i upośledzonych poznawczo. Technika ta podchodzi do najnowocześniejszej wydajności na danych tekstowych z powszechnie stosowanego zadania opisu obrazu "Kradzież ciasteczek", a w przeciwieństwie do ustalonych alternatyw również dobrze uogólnia spontaniczne rozmowy. Ponadto GPT-D generuje tekst o cechach, o których wiadomo, że są związane z AD, wskazując na indukcję anomalii językowych związanych z demencją. Nasze badania są krokiem w kierunku lepszego zrozumienia związków między wewnętrznym funkcjonowaniem generacyjnych modeli języka neuronowego, językiem, który wytwarzają, a szkodliwym wpływem demencji na ludzką mowę i cechy językowe.', 'mn': "Гүн гүнзгий суралцах (DL) техникууд маш олон загварын параметрыг тодорхойлох нь мэдлэг эрүүл хүмүүс болон Альцхаймер өвчинтэй хүмүүсийн хоорондох хэл хоорондын ялгааг ялгаалж чаддаг ажил дээр гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг гаргасан. Гэвч судалгаанд олон нийтэд ашиглаж чадах жижиг хэмжээний хэмжээсүүдээс гадна нийтлэг хэмжээсүүдийн талаар асуултууд байдаг. Загварын параметрыг шууд тохирох өөрчлөлт болгон бид ДL загвар (GPT-2) дээр ерөнхий Англи хэлний текст дээр сургалтын өмнө сургалтын шинэ арга загвар (GPT-D) болон өөрийгөө уран бүтээж буй хувилбартай холбогдож байна. Энэ техник шинэ хэрэглэгдсэн 'Cookie Theft' зураг тайлбарлах ажил дээрх текст өгөгдлийн хувьд урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг ойртох боломжтой. Мөн байгуулсан сонголтуудын ялгаа нь илүү сайн ярилцдаг. Мөн GPT-D нь AD-тэй холбогдож байгаа өөрчлөлтийг бий болгодог. Энэ нь хэлний хэлний хэлбэртэй холбогдолтоос холбогдолтыг харуулдаг. Бидний судалгаа бол доторх мэдрэлийн хэл загварын харилцааны харилцааны талаар илүү сайн ойлгох алхам юм.", 'no': 'Deep learning (DL) teknikkar som involverer finnstilling av stor tal modeller har levert uttrykkelig utvikling på oppgåva av diskriminasjon mellom språk produsert av kognitivt helse individuar, og dei som har Alzheimer s årbar (AD). Dette er imidlertid spørsmål om at dei kan generaliserast over dei små referanssetta som er offentlig tilgjengelege for forskning. Som alternativ for å passa inn modellparametrar direkte, foreslår vi eit nytt metode med at ein Transformer DL-modell (GPT-2) som er forelært på generell engelsk tekst er pairt med ein kunstig degradert versjon av seg selv (GPT-D) for å rekna ut forholdet mellom desse to modelane\\ textit{perplexities} på språk frå kognitivt helse og påvirka indikatora. Denne teknikken nærmer tilstanden av kunsthandlinga på tekstdata frå eit breidde brukt «Cookie Theft» biletsbeskrivelse oppgåve, og på ulike måte med oppretta alternativer genereliserer også godt til spontane samtaler. GPT-D lagar også tekst med eigenskapar som er kjent til å vera tilknytta med AD, som demonstrerer induksjonen av dementiske lingviske anomalier. Studeret vårt er ein steg mot bedre forståelse av forholdet mellom dei innere arbeidsområda av genererte neuralspråk-modeller, språket dei produserer, og den deleteriske effekten av dementia på menneske tale og språk-karakteristikk.', 'ro': 'Tehnicile de învățare profundă (DL) care implică reglarea fină a unui număr mare de parametri de model au oferit performanțe impresionante în ceea ce privește sarcina de discriminare între limbajul produs de indivizi sănătoși cognitiv și cei cu boala Alzheimer (AD). Cu toate acestea, rămân întrebări cu privire la capacitatea lor de a generaliza dincolo de micile seturi de referință care sunt disponibile public pentru cercetare. Ca alternativă la adaptarea directă a parametrilor modelului, propunem o metodă nouă prin care un model Transformer DL (GPT-2) pre-instruit pe text engleză generală este asociat cu o versiune degradată artificial a sa (GPT-D), pentru a calcula raportul dintre aceste două modele \\textit{perplexities} asupra limbajului de la persoane sănătoase și afectate cognitiv. Această tehnică abordează performanța de ultimă generație a datelor text dintr-o sarcină de descriere a imaginii "Furtul cookie" utilizată pe scară largă și, spre deosebire de alternativele stabilite, generalizează bine și conversațiilor spontane. În plus, GPT-D generează text cu caracteristici cunoscute a fi asociate cu AD, demonstrând inducția anomaliilor lingvistice legate de demență. Studiul nostru este un pas spre o mai bună înțelegere a relațiilor dintre funcționarea interioară a modelelor de limbaj neural generativ, limbajul pe care acestea îl produc și efectele dăunătoare ale demenței asupra vorbirii umane și caracteristicilor limbajului.', 'sr': "Tehnike dubokog učenja (DL) u kojima se uključuju veliki broj modelnih parametara ostvarili su impresivne učinke na zadatku diskriminacije jezika proizvodnje kognitivno zdravih pojedinaca i onih sa Alzheimerovom bolešću (AD). Međutim, pitanja ostaju o njihovoj sposobnosti generalizacije izvan malih referentnih setova koje su javno dostupne za istraživanje. Kao alternativa primjenjivanja modelnih parametara direktno, predlažemo novu metodu kojim je predobučen model Transformer DL (GPT-2) na općem engleskom tekstu povezan sa umjetnički degradiranom verzijom samog sebe (GPT-D), kako bi računali odnos između tih dva model a\\textit{perplexities} na jezik od kognitivno zdravih i oštećenih pojedinaca. Ova tehnika se približava izvedbi state-of-the-art na tekstualnim podacima iz široko korištenog zadatka opisa slike 'Kukijske krađe', a za razliku od uspostavljenih alternativa takođe generalizuje dobro na spontanske razgovore. Osim toga, GPT-D stvara tekst sa karakteristikama poznatim da su povezani s AD, pokazujući indukciju jezičkih anomalija povezanih sa demencijom. Naša studija je korak ka boljem razumijevanju odnosa između unutrašnjih radova generičnih neuralnih jezičkih modela, jezika koji proizvode, i deleterioznih efekta demencije na ljudski govor i jezičke karakteristike.", 'so': "Waxbarashada hoos u dheer (DL) oo ku saabsan parameters aad u badan oo model ah waxay sameeyeen shaqo aad u wanaagsan oo ku takoorista luqada oo si aqoon ah loo sameeyo dadka caafimaadka ah iyo kuwa qaba cudurka Alzheimer (AD). Si kastaba ha ahaatee su'aaladu waxay ku jiraan awooddooda ay wax ka soo saari karto qoraalka reference ee yaryar, kuwaas oo si bayaan ah u heli karta waxbarashada. Sida mid kale oo a an u bedelayo mid midibo si toos ah u habboon, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab warqad ah oo ku qoran qoraalka afka Ingiriiska (GPT-2) oo horay loo baray, si aan u xisaabno qaybaha labadan model dhexdooda ah, (perplexities) , taas oo afka laga soo baray qofka caafimaadka ah iyo naafada ah. Teknonikadan wuxuu u soo dhowaadaa xaalad-farshaxan oo ku saabsan macluumaadka sawirada sawirka 'Cookie Theft' oo ballaadhan lagu isticmaalayo, wuxuuna sidoo kale u soo bandhigaa fursad aan la dhigin inay si fiican u hadlaan. Furthermore, GPT-D generates text with characteristics known to be associated with AD, demonstrating the induction of dementia-related linguistic anomalies.  Waxbarashadeenu waa qaab aad u hagaagsan karto garashada xiriirka u dhexeeya shuqullada hoose ee muuqashada afka neurada ah, luuqadda ay soo bixinayaan, iyo saamaynta dhalashada ee dhimirka ee ku saabsan hadalka dadka iyo aqoonta luuqada.", 'si': "Deep learnt (DL) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ විශාල ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ භාෂ නමුත්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉන්නවා සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරි as an alternative to fitting Model Parametrics correctly, we preach a new way by where a Transferer DL Model (GPT-2) pre-Trained on General English text is Paid with an arteffically DeGraded Version of its own (GPT-D), to computer the rate of this 2 Model' \\textit{perplexity} on language from knowensively Health and Impaired individual. මේ තාක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර කරන්නේ පාළුවන් දත්තේ තියෙන්නේ state-of-the-art ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර කරන්න, සහ ස්ථාපිත ඉතින්, GPT-D එක්ක AD එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න දන්න පුළුවන් පාළුව නිර්මාණය කරනවා, සම්බන්ධ භාෂාත්මක විශේෂ විශ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි මිනිස්සු භාෂාව සහ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධතාවක් ගැන හොඳ සම්බන්ධතාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න පැත්තෙක් වෙන්නේ.", 'sv': "Djupinlärningstekniker (DL) som innebär finjustering av ett stort antal modellparametrar har gett imponerande resultat när det gäller uppgiften att skilja mellan språk som produceras av kognitivt friska individer och dem med Alzheimers sjukdom (AD). Dock kvarstår frågor om deras förmåga att generalisera bortom de små referensuppsättningar som är offentligt tillgängliga för forskning. Som ett alternativ till att anpassa modellparametrar direkt, föreslår vi en ny metod genom vilken en Transformer DL-modell (GPT-2) förkunskaps på allmän engelsk text paras ihop med en artificiellt nedbruten version av sig själv (GPT-D), för att beräkna förhållandet mellan dessa två modellers \\textit{perplexities} på språk från kognitivt friska och nedsatta individer. Denna teknik närmar sig state-of-the-art prestanda på textdata från en allmänt använd 'Cookie Theft' bildbeskrivning uppgift, och till skillnad från etablerade alternativ generaliserar också bra till spontana samtal. Dessutom genererar GPT-D text med egenskaper som är kända för att vara förknippade med AD, vilket visar induceringen av demensrelaterade språkliga avvikelser. Vår studie är ett steg mot bättre förståelse av relationerna mellan generativa neurala språkmodeller, vilket språk de producerar, och de skadliga effekterna av demens på mänskligt tal och språkegenskaper.", 'kk': "Қалыпты оқыту (DL) техникалары үлкен параметрлердің көп санын түзету үшін көптеген түрлі параметрлері көптеген тілдердің арасындағы дискриминациялық тапсырмасын және Альцгеймер ауруы (AD) жасалған адамдардың арасындағы Бірақ, зерттеулерге қол жеткізетін кішкентай сілтеме жиындарының артындағы сұрақтары жалпы болады. Біз үлгі параметрлерді тікелей келтіру альтернативі ретінде, DL үлгісін (GPT- 2) түрлендіру үлгісі (GPT- 2) жалпы ағылшын мәтінінде алдында оқылған түрлендіру әдісін өзінің өзінің өзінің өзінің өзінің өзінің өзінің (GPT- D) деградицияланған нұсқасымен біріктіріп Бұл техника 'Cookie Theft' суреттің сипаттамасының мәтін деректерінің күй- жай әрекеттеріне келеді, және құрылған альтернативтердің сипаттамасына сәйкес қолданылған мәтін деректерінің күй- жай әрекеттеріне Сонымен қатар, GPT- D AD- мен байланысты қасиеттермен мәтін құрады, деменциялық лингвистикалық аномалиялардың индукциясын көрсетеді. Біздің зерттеуіміз - адамдардың сөйлесу мен тіл қасиеттерінің ішкі жұмыс істеу үлгілерінің қатынасын жақсы түсінуге жақсы қадам.", 'ur': "عمیق تعلیم (DL) تکنیک جن میں بہت سی موڈل پارامیٹروں کے مطابق بہت سی تنظیم کی تعداد کے ذریعے لکھ رہی ہیں ان کی تعلیم پر اثر انگیز فعالیت پہنچائی گئی ہے جو زبانوں کے درمیان مطابق معلوم سلامتی شخصوں کے ذریعے پیدا ہوئی ہے اور ان کے However, questions remain about their ability to generalize beyond the small reference sets that are publicly available for research. موڈل پارامیٹروں کے مطابق مطابق مطابق پیدا کرنے کے لئے مختلف طریقہ کے طور پر، ہم ایک نوم طریقہ پیش کریں گے جس کے ذریعے ایک ٹرانسفور DL موڈل (GPT-2) جو عمومی انگلیسی متن پر پیش آموزش کی گئی ہے، اس کے ساتھ اپنے آپ کی آزمائش کے ذریعہ (GPT-D) سے جوڑ دیا گیا ہے، تاکہ ان دونوں موڈلوں کے درمیان مطابق کی نسبت شم یہ ٹیکنیک ٹیکسی ٹیکسی ٹیٹ ڈیٹ پر استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں ایک گھیرے طور پر استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں 'کوکی ٹیٹ ٹیٹ' تصاویر کی توصیف کے کام سے، اور مقرر کیے جاتے ہیں الٹیونیٹ کے بغیر مختلف بھی اسپانیٹ کی باتوں اور اس کے علاوہ، جی پی ٹی ڈی پیغام پیدا کرتا ہے جو AD کے ساتھ متعلق ہو جانے والی خصوصیات کے ساتھ پیغام پیدا کرتا ہے، جنہوں نے دیمنتیا متعلق ہونے والی زبان غلطیات کی پیغام دکھائی ہے. ہمارا مطالعہ بہترین سمجھنے کے لئے ایک قدم ہے کہ انسان کی بات اور زبان کے اختیاروں کے درمیان رابطہ معلوم کریں", 'ta': "பெரிய மாதிரி அளபுருக்களை பற்றிய ஆழமான கற்றல் (DL) தொழில்நுட்பம் அறிவில்லா உடைய நபர்களால் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மொழிகளுக்கிடையே வேறுபாடு செய்ய வேண்டும் மற்றும் அல ஆயினும், கேள்விகள் தான் அவர்களுடைய சிறிய குறிப்பு அமைப்புகளுக்கு மேல் பொதுவாக இருக்கும் என்பதை பற்றி  மாதிரி அளபுருக்களை நேரடியாக பொருத்துவதற்கு நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையாக பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அதைக் கொண்டு ஒரு மாற்று DL மாதிரி (GPT- 2) பொது ஆங்கிலத்தில் பயிற்சி முன்னோட்டம் சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, தன்னைத் தானே கு இந்த தொழில்நுட்பம் உரை தகவலில் உள்ள- கலை செயல்பாட்டிற்கு நெருங்குகிறது 'குக்கி விவரம்' படத்தின் விவரிப்பு பணியிலிருந்து 'நிறுவப்பட்ட மா அதற்கும், GPT- D உரையை AD உடன் இணைக்கப்படும் தன்மைகளுடன் உருவாக்குகிறது, டெமென்டியா தொடர்புடைய மொழி அசைவூட்டத்தை காட்டுகிறது. எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி ஒரு படி மனித பேச்சு மற்றும் மொழி தன்மைப்பண்புகளின் உள்ளமையில் உள்ள செயல்பாடுகளின் உறவுகளைப் புரிந்து கொள்ளும் சிறந்த ஒரு படி த", 'uz': "Ko'pchilik model parametrlari bilan juda yaxshi o'rganish (DL) usullar va sog'lomli shaxsiy odamlar va Alzheimer kasalligini (AD) bilan ajratish vazifasini juda ajoyib qiladi. Lekin, savollar faqat taʼminlovchi bo'lgan kichkina reference satrlarini yaratish qobiliyati haqida davom etadi. Andoza model parametrlariga boshqa bo'lgan boshqa bo'lgan so'zlar uchun Transformer DL modeli (GPT-2) bir bir o'rganish ingliz matnning umumiy matnning birinchi darajasi o'z quyidagi, bu ikkita modelning orasidagi qiymatni hisoblash uchun. Name Keyin GPT-D AD bilan bogʻ'liq boʻlgan hususiyatlar bilan matnni yaratadi, dementia bilan bogʻ'liq tillar anomaliyasini koʻrsatish. Our study is a step toward better understanding of the relationships between the inner workings of generative neural language models, the language that they produce, and the deleterious effects of dementia on human speech and language characteristics.", 'vi': 'Kỹ thuật học s âu (DL) với độ tinh chỉnh độ lượng lớn các thông số mô hình đã tạo ra hiệu quả ấn tượng trong nhiệm vụ phân biệt ngôn ngữ được sản xuất bởi những cá nhân lành mạnh nhận thức và những người mắc bệnh Alzheimer (AD). Tuy nhiên, vẫn còn câu hỏi về khả năng tổng hợp của họ vượt ra ngoài những nhóm tham khảo nhỏ mà có công chúng để nghiên cứu. Thay thế cho việc điều chỉnh các tham số mô hình mẫu trực tiếp, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới dùng để định hình mô hình transformer DL (GPT-2) đã được rèn luyện trên văn bản tiếng Anh chung với một phiên bản bị suy thoái hóa nhân vật (GPT-D), tính tỷ lệ giữa hai mô hình này (\\ textit (perplexity) trên ngôn ngữ so với những cá nhân lành mạnh và bị suy giảm. Phương pháp này tiến gần với trình độ nghệ thuật của dữ liệu văn bản từ một công việc mô tả bức tranh Cookie Theft phổ biến, và không như những phương pháp đã xác định cũng phổ biến tốt cho cuộc nói chuyện tự phát. Chế độ GPT-D tạo ra văn bản với các đặc điểm được biết là có liên quan với AD, hiển thị sự xuất hiện các dị tật ngôn ngữ liên quan tới rối loạn. Nghiên cứu của chúng tôi là một bước tiến tới sự hiểu tốt hơn về mối quan hệ giữa hoạt động nội bộ của các mô hình thần kinh hệ hệ thống, ngôn ngữ mà chúng sản xuất, và tác động độc hại của chứng mất trí lên tính cách nói và ngôn ngữ con người.', 'bg': 'Техниките за дълбоко учене (ДЛ), включващи фина настройка на голям брой параметри на модела, са предоставили впечатляващо представяне на задачата за разграничаване на езика, произведен от когнитивно здрави индивиди, и тези с болестта на Алцхаймер (AD). Все пак остават въпроси относно способността им да обобщават отвъд малките референтни набори, които са публично достъпни за научни изследвания. Като алтернатива на директно приспособяване на параметрите на модела предлагаме нов метод, чрез който трансформаторен модел (ГПТ-2), предварително обучен на общ английски текст, се сдвоява с изкуствено деградирана версия на себе си (ГПТ-Д), за да се изчисли съотношението между тези два модела за езика от когнитивно здрави и увредени индивиди. Тази техника подхожда към най-съвременното представяне на текстови данни от широко използвана задача за описание на картината "Кражба на бисквитки", и за разлика от установените алтернативи също обобщава добре спонтанните разговори. Освен това GPT-D генерира текст с характеристики, за които е известно, че са свързани с AD, демонстрирайки индукцията на свързани с деменцията лингвистични аномалии. Нашето изследване е стъпка към по-добро разбиране на връзките между вътрешната работа на генеративните невронни езикови модели, езика, който те произвеждат и вредните ефекти на деменцията върху човешките речни и езикови характеристики.', 'da': "Dyb læring (DL) teknikker, der indebærer finjustering af et stort antal modelparametre, har leveret imponerende resultater i opgaven med at skelne mellem sprog produceret af kognitivt raske individer og dem med Alzheimers sygdom (AD). Der er dog stadig spørgsmål om deres evne til at generalisere ud over de små referencesæt, der er offentligt tilgængelige for forskning. Som et alternativ til at tilpasse modelparametre direkte, foreslår vi en ny metode, hvor en Transformer DL model (GPT-2) forudtrænet på generel engelsk tekst parres med en kunstigt nedbrudt version af sig selv (GPT-D), for at beregne forholdet mellem disse to models \\textit{perplexities} på sprog fra kognitivt raske og nedsatte individer. Denne teknik nærmer sig state-of-the-art performance på tekstdata fra en almindeligt anvendt 'Cookie tyveri' billedbeskrivelsesopgave, og i modsætning til etablerede alternativer genererer også godt til spontane samtaler. Desuden genererer GPT-D tekst med kendetegn, der kendes for at være forbundet med AD, hvilket demonstrerer induceringen af demensrelaterede sproglige anomalier. Vores undersøgelse er et skridt i retning af bedre forståelse af forholdet mellem generative neurale sprogmodeller, det sprog, de producerer, og de skadelige virkninger af demens på menneskelig tale og sprogkarakteristika.", 'hr': "Tehnike dubokog učenja (DL) u kojima se uključuju veliki broj modelnih parametara ostvarili su impresivne učinke na zadatku diskriminacije jezika proizvođenog kognitivno zdravim pojedincima i onima s Alzheimerovom bolešću (AD). Međutim, pitanja ostaju o njihovoj sposobnosti generalizacije izvan malih referentnih setova koje su javno dostupne za istraživanje. Kao alternativa primjenjivanja modelnih parametara direktno, predlažemo novu metodu kojim je predobučen Transformer DL model (GPT-2) na općem engleskom tekstu povezan s umjetno degradiranom verzijom samog sebe (GPT-D) kako bi računali odnos između tih dva model a\\textit{perplexities} na jezik od kognitivno zdravih i oštećenih pojedinaca. Ova tehnika se približava izvedbi stanja umjetnosti na podacima teksta iz široko korišćenog zadatka opisa slike 'Kukijske krađe', a za razliku od uspostavljenih alternativa također dobro generalizira spontanske razgovore. Osim toga, GPT-D stvara tekst s karakteristikama koje se poznaju povezanim s AD, pokazujući indukciju jezičkih anomalija povezanih s demencijom. Naše ispitivanje je korak ka boljem razumijevanju odnosa između unutrašnjih radova generičnih neuralnih jezičkih modela, jezika koji proizvode, i deleterioznih učinaka demencije na ljudski govor i jezičke karakteristike.", 'nl': "Deep learning (DL) technieken waarbij grote aantallen modelparameters worden verfijnd, hebben indrukwekkende prestaties opgeleverd bij het onderscheiden van taal geproduceerd door cognitief gezonde individuen en mensen met de ziekte van Alzheimer (AD). Er blijven echter vragen over hun vermogen om verder te generaliseren dan de kleine referentiesets die openbaar beschikbaar zijn voor onderzoek. Als alternatief voor het direct aanpassen van modelparameters stellen we een nieuwe methode voor waarbij een Transformer DL model (GPT-2) voorgetraind op algemene Engelse tekst gekoppeld wordt aan een kunstmatig gedegradeerde versie van zichzelf (GPT-D), om de verhouding tussen deze twee modellen te berekenen op taal van cognitief gezonde en gehandicapte individuen. Deze techniek benadert state-of-the-art prestaties op tekstgegevens van een veelgebruikte 'Cookie Theft' beeldbeschrijvingstaak, en in tegenstelling tot gevestigde alternatieven generaliseert deze ook goed voor spontane gesprekken. Verder genereert GPT-D tekst met kenmerken waarvan bekend is dat ze geassocieerd zijn met AD, wat de inductie van dementiegerelateerde taalafwijkingen aantoont. Onze studie is een stap naar een beter begrip van de relaties tussen de innerlijke werking van generatieve neurale taalmodellen, de taal die ze produceren en de schadelijke effecten van dementie op menselijke spraak en taalkenmerken.", 'id': "Teknik belajar dalam (DL) yang melibatkan memperbaiki jumlah besar parameter model telah memberikan prestasi yang mengesankan pada tugas diskriminasi antara bahasa yang diproduksi oleh individu yang sehat secara kognitif, dan orang-orang dengan penyakit Alzheimer (AD). However, questions remain about their ability to generalize beyond the small reference sets that are publicly available for research.  As an alternative to fitting model parameters directly, we propose a novel method by which a Transformer DL model (GPT-2) pre-trained on general English text is paired with an artificially degraded version of itself (GPT-D), to compute the ratio between these two models' \\textit{perplexities} on language from cognitively healthy and impaired individuals.  Teknik ini mendekati prestasi state-of-the-art pada data teks dari tugas deskripsi gambar 'Pencurian Cookie' yang digunakan secara luas, dan tidak seperti alternatif yang ditetapkan juga mendeneralisasi dengan baik untuk percakapan spontan. Selain itu, GPT-D menghasilkan teks dengan karakteristik yang dikenal terkait dengan AD, menunjukkan induksi anomali bahasa yang berhubungan dengan demensi. Pelajaran kami adalah langkah menuju ke pemahaman yang lebih baik tentang hubungan antara kerja dalam model bahasa saraf generasi, bahasa yang mereka hasilkan, dan efek yang merugikan dari demensi pada pidato manusia dan karakteristik bahasa.", 'ko': "딥러닝(DL) 기술은 수많은 모델 매개 변수를 미세하게 조정하는 것과 관련돼 건강한 개체와 알츠하이머병(AD) 환자를 인지하는 언어를 구분하는 데 인상적인 성과를 거뒀다.그러나 이들이 연구할 수 있는 작은 참고집을 공개하는 것 외에 개괄할 능력이 있는지 의문이다.모델 매개 변수를 직접 의합하는 대체 방법으로 우리는 일반 영어 텍스트에 미리 훈련된 Transformer DL 모델(GPT-2)을 자신의 인공 퇴화 버전(GPT-D)과 배합하여 이 두 모델이 인지 건강과 손상된 개체의 언어에 대한 \\textit {complexities} 비율을 계산하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.이런 기술은 광범위하게 사용되는'쿠키 절도'이미지 묘사 작업 중의 텍스트 데이터에서 가장 선진적인 성능에 가깝고 기존의 대체 방법과 달리 자발적인 대화에도 잘 보급될 수 있다.또한 GPT-D가 생성한 텍스트는 AD와 연관된 것으로 알려진 특징이 있어 치매 관련 언어 이상 유도를 입증했다.우리의 연구는 생성성 신경언어모델의 내부 작업 메커니즘, 그것들이 발생하는 언어와 치매가 인류의 언어와 언어 특징에 미치는 해로운 영향 간의 관계를 더욱 잘 이해하기 위한 것이다.", 'sw': "Teknolojia za kujifunza kwa kina (DL) zinazohusiana na vipimo vingi vya mifano vizuri vimeleta ufanisi mkubwa katika jukumu la kubagua kati ya lugha zilizotengenezwa kwa ujuzi, na wale wenye ugonjwa wa Alzheimer (AD). Hata hivyo, maswali yanabaki kuhusiana na uwezo wao wa kuzalisha zaidi ya vituo vidogo vya maoni vinavyopatikana hadharani kwa ajili ya utafiti. Kama mbadala wa parameters za mifano moja kwa moja, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kitabu ambapo modeli ya DL ya Transformer (GPT-2) inayofundishwa kwa ujumla katika ujumla wa Kiingereza inaunganishwa na toleo la kisasa la kujitolea (GPT-D), kuhesabu kiwango kati ya mifano hizi mbili' \\textit {perplexities} katika lugha ya watu walio na afya na wenye ulemavu. Kiteknolojia hiki kinaingia hali ya utendaji wa sanaa kwenye taarifa za maandishi kutoka kazi ya maelezo mengi ya picha ya 'Kutumia Viungo vya Cookie', na tofauti tofauti zilizotengenezwa pia zinatengeneza mazungumzo mazuri kwa wenyewe. Zaidi ya hayo, GPT-D inatengeneza ujumbe wa ujumbe wenye sifa zinazofahamika na AD, wakionyesha kutengenezwa kwa lugha zinazohusiana na ukatili. Utafiti wetu ni hatua bora kuelewa mahusiano kati ya kazi za ndani ya mifano ya lugha ya uboreshaji, lugha ambayo wanauzalisha, na madhara ya kifo kuhusu lugha ya binadamu na sifa za lugha.", 'tr': "Derrew öwrenmek (DL) teknikleri, köp sany nusgala parametralary bilen tanyş saglykly adamlar we Alzheimer hastalıklary tarapyndan üretilen diller arasynda paýlaşmak täsirinde täsirli täsirler getirdi. Ýöne, araşdyrma üçin publika ulagany üçin kiçi referans düzlerinden öňünden ukyplarynyň ukyplary barada galyp barýar. Diňe nusga parameterlere gollanmak üçin, biz bu iki nusga arasyndaky terjime etmek üçin DL nusga (GPT-2) hem bilim saglykdan we hasaplanýan adamlaryň arasynda terjime edilen iňlis metiniň (GPT-D) täze bir nusga üýtgedik Bu teknikiýa 'Köki oňat' suratynyň waspyndan ullanýan metin maglumatynda state-of-the-art eserlerini golaýlaýar we guruldan başka seçeneklerden daşary hem spontanly gürrüňlere gowy görkez. Munuň üçin GPT-D AD bilen tanaýan hatlary bilen metin döredir. Depans bilen ilgili dil anomaliýasynyň täsirini görkez. Biziň öwrenmegimiz ynsan çykyşyň we dil özelliklerinde nähili işleýän işiň içindeki nähili işleriniň, üretýän dilleriň, we adam çykyşyň we dil özelliklerinde çykyş täsirleriniň ýüregi gowurak ýüzerinde bir adım.", 'af': "Deep leer (DL) teknike wat die fine-tuning van groot aantal modelle parameters invoer het, het inpresief effektuur aangevra op die taak van diskriminasie tussen taal wat deur kognitief gesonde individuele geproduseer is, en die wat met Alzheimer se sykdom (AD) is. Maar vrae bly oor hul moontlikheid om gewone te maak buite die klein verwysing stelle wat openlik beskikbaar is vir ondersoek. As 'n alternatief om model parameters direk te pas, voorstel ons 'n roman metode waarmee 'n Transformer DL model (GPT-2) vooraf-onderwerp word op algemene Engels teks met 'n kunstensielik afgebreekte weergawe van homself (GPT-D), om die verhouding tussen hierdie twee modele' \\textit{perpleksies} op taal te bereken van kognitief gesond en geïnvoudige individuele. Hierdie tekniks naby state-of-the-art-performance op teks data van 'n vaste gebruikte 'Cookie Theft' fotobeskrywing taak, en ongelukkig geïnstalleerde alternatiewe genereer ook goed na spontanee gesprekke. Daarom genereer GPT-D teks met karakteristieke wat bekend is om te geassosieer met AD te wees, wat die induksie van dementie-verwante lingvisse anomalies vertoon. Ons studie is 'n stap tot beter verstanding van die verwantings tussen die binneste werke van genereerbare neurale taal modele, die taal wat hulle produseer en die deleteriese effekte van demensie op menslike spreek en taal karakteristieke.", 'fa': 'تکنیک\u200cهای یادگیری عمیق (DL) که شامل تعداد زیادی از پارامترهای مدل\u200cها تغییر\u200cسازی می\u200cکنند، عملکرد تحت تاثیر قرار داده\u200cاند بر وظیفه جدایی بین زبان\u200cها که توسط فرد\u200cهای سلامتی شناخته\u200cای تولید شده\u200cاند، و کسانی که با بیمار با این حال، سوالات در مورد توانایی آنها که بیشتر از مجموعه\u200cهای مرتبط کوچک برای تحقیقات به طور عمومی موجود می\u200cباشند. به عنوان جایگزینی برای پارامترهای مدل مستقیما، ما یک روش نوی پیشنهاد می کنیم که یک مدل تغییر دهنده DL (GPT-2) پیش آموزش یافته در متن انگلیسی ژنرال با نسخه\u200cای که به هنری از خود (GPT-D) نابود شده است جفت می\u200cکند تا نسبت بین این دو مدل\\ textit{perplexities} روی زبان از افراد سلامتی شناخته و تاثیر شده است. این تکنیک به فعالیت وضعیت هنری نزدیک می\u200cشود بر داده\u200cهای متن از یک کار توصیف تصویر «دزدی کوکیها» وسیع استفاده می\u200cشود، و به مخالف انتخابات\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cشود، در حالی که به صحبت\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cشود، نیز به طور کامل به صحب علاوه بر این، GPT-D متن را با ویژگی\u200cهایی که می\u200cشناسند با AD ارتباط می\u200cشوند تولید می\u200cکند، که نشان می\u200cدهد اخلاق زبان\u200cشناسی رابطه به جنسی است. مطالعه ما یک قدم به بهتر درک رابطه بین کارهای داخلی مدل های زبان عصبی، زبانی که تولید می کنند، و اثرات حذف انگیزی روی صحبت و ویژه های زبان انسان است.', 'sq': "Teknikët e mësimit të thellë (DL) që përfshijnë rregullimin e numrave të mëdha të parametrave të modelit kanë dhënë performancë mbresëlënëse në detyrën e diskriminimit midis gjuhës prodhuar nga individë të shëndetshëm në mënyrë kognitive dhe atyre me s ëmundjen e Alzheimerit (AD). Megjithatë, pyetjet mbeten rreth aftësisë së tyre për të gjeneralizuar përtej grupeve të vogla referimi që janë publikisht në dispozicion për kërkime. Si një alternativë për të përshtatur drejtpërdrejt parametrat e modelit, ne propozojmë një metodë të re me të cilën një model DL Transformer (GPT-2) i paratrajnuar në tekstin e përgjithshëm anglez është barazuar me një version të degraduar artificialisht të vetvetes (GPT-D), për të llogaritur raportin midis këtyre dy modeleve '\\textit{perplexities} në gjuhën nga individë të shëndetshëm dhe të dëmtuar në mënyrë kognitive. Kjo teknikë afrohet paraqitjes më të moderne në të dhënat e tekstit nga një detyrë e përshkrimit të fotove të përdorur gjerësisht 'vjedhje biskotash', dhe në ndryshim nga alternativat e vendosura gjithashtu gjeneralizohet mirë për bisedimet spontane. Përveç kësaj, GPT-D gjeneron tekst me karakteristika të njohura që janë të lidhura me AD, duke demonstruar induksionin e anomalive gjuhësore të lidhura me demencën. Our study is a step toward better understanding of the relationships between the inner workings of generative neural language models, the language that they produce, and the deleterious effects of dementia on human speech and language characteristics.", 'am': "በጥልቅ ትምህርት (DL) የሞዴል አካባቢዎች በቋንቋዎች መካከል በአውቀት ጤናሞች እና በአልዝheimer ደዌ ያሉትን (AD) እና በቋንቋዎች መካከል የሚለዩትን በማስተካከል ስርዓት በማድረግ ያስተማሩ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ጥያቄዎች ለምርመራ የተገኘው ትንሽ የፍቺው ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል ማቅረብ ላይ የሚችሉትን ጥያቄዎች ይኖራሉ፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ ጽሑፍ ላይ የተማረከ የፊተኛ DL ሞዴል (GPT-2) በተለየ የእንግሊዝኛ ጽሑፍ ላይ የተማረከ የእርሱ መልዕክት (GPT-D) በተለየ የእነዚህን በሁለቱ model ሎች መካከል ክፍተት ለመቆጠር የጽሑፍ (perplexities) በቋንቋ ላይ አካባቢ ጤና እና ደካማ ያላቸው ሰዎች ይቆጥራሉ፡፡ This technique approaches state-of-the-art performance on text data from a widely used 'Cookie Theft' picture description task, and unlike established alternatives also generalizes well to spontaneous conversations.  ከዚህም በላይ GPT-D ከAD ጋር የሚታወቁ የሥርዓት ጽሑፍ ፍጥረት ያስገኛል፤ የዲሜኔሲ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ተቋማኝነትን ለማሳየት ነው፡፡ ትምህርታችን በአውስጠኛው የናውራዊ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለማስተዋል የሚሻል ደረጃ ነው፤ እናም በሚያሳድጉት ቋንቋ እና በሚያሳድጉት የሞት ግንኙነት በሰው ቋንቋ እና ቋንቋ ስህተት ላይ የሚያጠፋው ውጤቶች ነው፡፡", 'de': 'Deep Learning (DL)-Techniken mit der Feinabstimmung großer Anzahl von Modellparametern haben beeindruckende Ergebnisse bei der Unterscheidung zwischen Sprache, die von kognitiv gesunden Individuen produziert wird, und derjenigen mit Alzheimer (AD) geliefert. Es bleiben jedoch Fragen nach ihrer Fähigkeit, über die kleinen Referenzsätze hinaus zu verallgemeinern, die öffentlich für die Forschung verfügbar sind. Als Alternative zur direkten Anpassung von Modellparametern schlagen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, mit der ein Transformer DL-Modell (GPT-2), das auf allgemeinem englischen Text vortrainiert wurde, mit einer künstlich degradierten Version von sich selbst (GPT-D) gekoppelt wird, um das Verhältnis zwischen diesen beiden Modellen auf Sprache kognitiv gesunder und beeinträchtigter Personen zu berechnen. Diese Technik nähert sich der State-of-the-Art-Performance von Textdaten aus einer weit verbreiteten Bildbeschreibungsaufgabe "Cookie Theft" an und verallgemeinert im Gegensatz zu etablierten Alternativen auch gut zu spontanen Gesprächen. Darüber hinaus generiert GPT-D Text mit bekannten Merkmalen, die mit AD assoziiert sind, was die Induktion von demenzbedingten sprachlichen Anomalien demonstriert. Unsere Studie ist ein Schritt zum besseren Verständnis der Zusammenhänge zwischen den inneren Funktionsweisen generativer neuronaler Sprachmodelle, der Sprache, die sie produzieren, und den schädlichen Auswirkungen von Demenz auf menschliche Sprache und Spracheigenschaften.', 'az': "Bütün modellərin çoxluğunu düzəltməsi haqqındakı derin öyrənmə (DL) tehnikləri, bilikli sağlam kişilər tərəfindən və Alzheimer xəstəliyi tərəfindən olub dillərin arasındakı fərqlənməsi haqqında təsir etdilər. Lakin, araştırmalar üçün açıq-aşkar mümkün olan küçük referans setlərindən ötrü onların generalizasyon qabiliyyəti haqqında soruşurlar. Model parametrlərini düzgün uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün alternatif olaraq, bu iki modeli arasındakı\\textit{perplexities} dilindən öyrənmiş Transformer DL modeli (GPT-2) ilə birləşdirilmiş nümunəli İngilizə metinlərindən əvvəl təhsil edilən yeni metodu təklif edirik. Bu tehnika geniş işlədilən 'Cookie Theft' şəkillərin qismindəki məlumat məlumat məlumatının stat-of-the-art performansına yaxınlaşır və qurulduqları alternatifların bənzəri də spontanlı söhbətlərə çox yaxşı işlər edir. Daha sonra, GPT-D AD ilə ilişkiləri ilə tanınan əlaqələr ilə mətn yaratır, demenciya bağlı dil anomaliyalarının induksyonunu göstərər. Bizim öyrənməyimiz insan sözləri və dil özellikləri barəsindəki nöral dil modellerinin iç işləri ilə daha yaxşı anlamaq üçün bir adımdır.", 'bs': "Tehnike dubokog učenja (DL) u kojima se uključuju veliki broj modelnih parametara ostvarili su impresivne učinke na zadatku diskriminacije jezika proizvođenog kognitivno zdravim pojedincima i onima s Alzheimerovom bolešću (AD). Međutim, pitanja ostaju o njihovoj sposobnosti generalizacije izvan malih referentnih seta koje su javno dostupne za istraživanje. Kao alternativa primjenjivanja modelnih parametara direktno, predlažemo novu metodu kojim je predobučen Transformer DL model (GPT-2) na općem engleskom tekstu povezan s umjetnički degradiranom verzijom samog sebe (GPT-D), kako bi računali odnos između tih dva model a\\textit{perplexities} na jezik od kognitivno zdravih i oštećenih pojedinaca. Ova tehnika se približava izvedbi state-of-the-art na tekstualnim podacima iz široko korišćenog zadatka opisa slike 'Kukijske krađe', a za razliku od uspostavljenih alternativa također dobro generalizira spontanske razgovore. Osim toga, GPT-D stvara tekst sa karakteristikama koje se poznaju povezivati s AD, pokazujući indukciju jezičkih anomalija povezanih sa demencijom. Naša studija je korak ka boljem razumijevanju odnosa između unutrašnjih radova generičnih neuralnih jezičkih modela, jezika koji proizvode, i deleterioznih učinaka demencije na ljudski govor i jezičke karakteristike.", 'hy': 'Գործողական առողջ անհատների և Ալցհեյմերի հիվանդների միջև արտահայտված լեզուների խտրականության խնդիրը տպավորիչ արդյունք է բերել: Այնուամենայնիվ, դեռևս կան հարցեր նրանց ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընդհանուր հատվածներից դուրս, որոնք հանրային հասանելի են հետազոտության համար: Որպես այլընտրանք մոդելի պարամետրերի ուղղակիորեն համապատասխանելուն, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ, որի միջոցով ընդհանուր անգլերեն տեքստի վրա նախապատրաստված Թանֆորմեր Դլ մոդելը (GPT-2) զուգավորվում է իր արհեստական կործանված տարբերակի հետ (GPT-D), որպեսզի հաշվարկի այս երկու մոդելների \'\\Texit{խառնաշփոթություններ Այս տեխնոլոգիան մոտենում է տեքստի տվյալների լայնորեն օգտագործված "Քուկիկի գողության" նկարագրման խնդրի տեքստի տվյալների ամենաբարձր արտադրողություններին, և հակառակ հաստատված այլընտրանքներին, նաև լավ ընդհանուր է ինքնաբուխ հաղորդ Ավելին, GPT-D-ը ստեղծում է տեքստ, որը հայտնի է, որ կապված է ԱԴ-ի հետ, ցույց տալով դեմենցիային կապված լեզվական անոմալիաների ինդուկցիան: Մեր ուսումնասիրությունը քայլ է գնում դեպի ավելի լավ հասկանալ հարաբերությունները սերունդային նյարդային լեզվի մոդելների ներքին գործողությունների, լեզուների, որոնք նրանք ստեղծում են, և դեմենցիայի վնասավոր ազդեցությունները մարդկային խոսքի և լեզվի առանձնահատկու', 'bn': "গভীর শিক্ষা (ডিএলএল) প্রযুক্তি যার মধ্যে সুন্দর মডেলের সংখ্যা বিশাল পরামিতির মধ্যে রয়েছে তারা স্বাস্থ্য ব্যক্তিদের সৃষ্টি করেছে ভাষার মধ্যে বৈষম্যের কাজে  তবে তাদের ক্ষুদ্র রেফারেন্স সেটের বাইরে জেনারেল করার ক্ষমতার ব্যাপারে প্রশ্ন এখনো থাকে যা গবেষণার জন্য সরাসরি মোডেলের প্যারামিটারের বিকল্প হিসেবে আমরা একটি নvel পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যার মাধ্যমে সাধারণ ইংরেজী টেক্সটে একটি ট্রান্সফার্নার্স ডিএল মডেল (জিপিটি-২) প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে তার নিজের একটি কৌতূহল এই প্রযুক্তিটি ব্যবহৃত 'কুকি থিফ্ট' ছবির বর্ণনা কাজ থেকে টেক্সট ডাটারের মাধ্যমে শিল্পের পরিস্থিতি প্রদর্শনের কাছে প্রাপ্ত হয় এবং স্বয়ংক্রি এছাড়াও, জিপিটি-ডি ডিমেন্টিয়া সম্পর্কিত ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রতিষ্ঠানের প্রতিবাদ প্রদর্শন করে যে বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে যুক্তি আমাদের গবেষণা হচ্ছে জেনারেটিভ নিউরেল ভাষা মডেলের ভেতরের কাজের মধ্যে যে সম্পর্ক বুঝতে পারে, সেই ভাষা, যা তারা উৎপাদন করে এবং মানুষের ভাষা এবং ভা", 'ca': "Les tècniques d'aprenentatge profund (DL) que impliquen ajustar grans quantitats de paràmetres model s han donat un rendiment impressionant en la tasca de discriminar entre el llenguatge produït per individus cognitivament saludables i aquells amb malaltia d'Alzheimer (AD). Però encara hi ha preguntes sobre la seva habilitat de generalitzar-se més enllà dels petits conjunts de referències que estan disponibles per a la recerca. Com a alternativa a ajustar els paràmetres del model directament, proposem un mètode nou pel qual un model DL Transformer (GPT-2) pré-entrenat en text anglès general està parellat amb una versió artificialment degradada d'ell mateix (GPT-D), per calcular la relació entre aquests dos models' \\textit{perplexities} en el llenguatge d'individus cognitivament saludables i deficients. This technique approaches state-of-the-art performance on text data from a widely used 'Cookie Theft' picture description task, and unlike established alternatives also generalizes well to spontaneous conversations.  Furthermore, GPT-D generates text with characteristics known to be associated with AD, demonstrating the induction of dementia-related linguistic anomalies.  El nostre estudi és un pas cap a una millor comprensió de les relacions entre el funcionament interior de models de llenguatge neural generadors, el llenguatge que produeixen i els efectes deleteriosos de la demència en la fala humana i les característiques lingüístices.", 'cs': 'Techniky hlubokého učení (DL) zahrnující jemné ladění velkého počtu modelových parametrů přinesly působivý výkon při rozlišování jazyka produkovaného kognitivně zdravými jedinci a těmi s Alzheimerovou chorobou (AD). Nicméně zůstávají otázky o jejich schopnosti zobecňovat mimo malé referenční sady, které jsou veřejně dostupné pro výzkum. Jako alternativu k přímému přizpůsobení parametrů modelu navrhujeme novou metodu, kterou je Transformer DL model (GPT-2) předcvičený na obecném anglickém textu spárován s uměle degradovanou verzí sebe (GPT-D), aby byl vypočítán poměr mezi těmito dvěma modely\' \\textit{matplectities} na jazyk od kognitivně zdravých a postižených jedinců. Tato technika přistupuje k nejmodernějšímu výkonu textových dat z široce používaného popisu obrázků "Cookie Theft" a na rozdíl od zavedených alternativ se dobře zobecňuje i spontánní konverzace. Dále GPT-D generuje text s charakteristikami spojenými s AD, což demonstruje indukci jazykových anomálií souvisejících s demencí. Naše studie je krokem k lepšímu pochopení vztahů mezi vnitřním fungováním generativních neuronových jazykových modelů, jazykem, který produkují, a škodlivými vlivy demence na lidskou řeč a jazykové charakteristiky.', 'et': 'Sügavõppe (DL) tehnikad, mis hõlmavad suure hulga mudeliparameetrite täpsustamist, on andnud muljetavaldavat tulemust kognitiivselt tervete inimeste ja Alzheimeri tõvega inimeste toodetud keele eristamisel. Siiski jäävad küsimused nende võime üldistada kaugemale väikestest viitekogumitest, mis on avalikult teadusuuringuteks kättesaadavad. Alternatiivina mudeli parameetrite otsesele sobitamisele pakume välja uudse meetodi, mille abil eelnevalt inglise keele keelele koolitatud Transformer DL mudel (GPT-2) paaritatakse kunstlikult halvenenud versiooniga endast (GPT-D), et arvutada nende kahe mudeli\\textit{perplexities} suhe kognitiivselt tervete ja puudega inimeste keelele. See tehnika läheneb tipptasemel esitusele tekstiandmetel laialdaselt kasutatud "Küpsiste varguse" pildi kirjelduse ülesandest ning erinevalt väljakujunenud alternatiividest üldistab hästi ka spontaansetele vestlustele. Lisaks tekitab GPT-D tekst, mille tunnused on teadaolevalt seotud Alzheimeriga, näidates dementsusega seotud keeleliste anomaaliate esilekutsumist. Meie uuring on samm parema arusaamise suunas seostest generatiivsete närvikeelemudelite sisemise toimimise, nende toodetava keele ning dementsuse kahjulike mõjude vahel inimese kõne- ja keeleomadustele.', 'fi': 'Deep learning (DL) -tekniikat, joissa hienosäädetään useita malliparametreja, ovat tuottaneet vaikuttavaa suorituskykyä kognitiivisesti terveiden henkilöiden tuottaman kielen ja Alzheimerin taudin (AD) välillä. Kysymystä jää kuitenkin niiden kyvystä yleistyä tutkimuksen kannalta yleisesti saatavilla olevien pienten viitesarjojen ulkopuolelle. Vaihtoehtona malliparametrien suoraan sovittamiselle ehdotamme uutta menetelmää, jolla englanninkieliseen tekstiin ennalta koulutettu Transformer DL -malli (GPT-2) yhdistetään keinotekoisesti heikentyneeseen versioon itsestään (GPT-D), jotta voidaan laskea näiden kahden mallin\\textit{perplexities} suhde kognitiivisesti terveiden ja vammaisten henkilöiden kieleen. Tämä tekniikka lähestyy huippuluokan esitystä tekstidatalla laajasti käytetystä Cookie Theft -kuvakuvauksesta, ja toisin kuin vakiintuneet vaihtoehdot, se yleistyy hyvin spontaaneihin keskusteluihin. Lisäksi GPT-D tuottaa tekstiä, jonka tiedetään liittyvän Alzheimeriin, mikä osoittaa dementiaan liittyvien kielellisten poikkeavuuksien induktion. Tutkimuksemme on askel kohti parempaa ymmärrystä generatiivisten neurokielimallien sisäisen toiminnan, niiden tuottaman kielen ja dementian haitallisten vaikutusten välillä ihmisen puheen ja kielen ominaisuuksiin.', 'jv': "deep Nanging, kesempatan mbuh sabanjuré kapan-sabanjuré kanggo ngubah apakno sing mengko perkara sing mengko nggawe resampungan. as an Alternate to match model parameters directively, we proposal a new method by that a Transformer DL model Teknik iki dadi ngegolok state-of-the-Art na akeh nggambar kelangan kelangan kelangan kelangan seneng ampungan gambar 'Kuki Theft a' nggambar kelangan gambar, lan nganggo cah-cah lanjut sing dibenalke Alternate yang sumulakno akeh iso nggawe tarjamahan Lahan tambah, GST-D mbukak kelangan seneng nggawe perintaksi sing ngerasakno karo ASD, nggawe barang kelangan langgambar barang debita. Awakdhéwé éntuk kuwi akèh sing luwih luwih apik kanggo ngerasakno karo hal sampeyan ingkang karo hal bantuan ingkang, kuwi nggawe ngubah dhéwé, lan uwong sing ngerasakno kanggo awak dhéwé, lan uwong sing ngerasakno pangan karo perusahaan kanggo langgar.", 'he': "טכניקות למידה עמוקה (DL) שמעניינות מספרים גדולים של פרמטרים דוגמנים מתאימים הביאו ביצועים מרשים על המשימה של ההבדל בין שפה שנוצרה על ידי אנשים בריאים קוגניטיביים, ואלה עם מחלת אלצהיימר (AD). בכל אופן, נשארו שאלות על היכולת שלהם לגנרליזציה מעבר לקבוצות התייחסות הקטנות שזמינות לציבור למחקר. כחלופה להתאים פרמטרים מודל ישירות, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה שבה מודל DL Transformer (GPT-2) מאומן מראש על טקסט אנגלי כללי זוג בגרסה מופרסת באופן מלאכותי של עצמו (GPT-D), כדי לחשב את היחס בין שני המודלים '\\textit{perplexities} על שפה מאנשים בריאים קוגניטיבית ומכשירים. This technique approaches state-of-the-art performance on text data from a widely used 'Cookie Theft' picture description task, and unlike established alternatives also generalizes well to spontaneous conversations.  חוץ מזה, GPT-D מייצר טקסט עם אופיינים ידועים להיות קשורים לאד.איי, בהוכיחה את התגרות של anomalies שפותיות קשורות לדמנציה. המחקר שלנו הוא צעד לכיוון הבנה טובה יותר של מערכות היחסים בין העבודות הפנימיות של דוגמני שפת עצבית דוורתיים, השפה שהם מייצרים, וההשפעות המחיקות של דמנציה על הנאום האנושי והתכונות השפה.", 'ha': "Tsarin da aka sani (DL) masu amfani da wasu parameteri masu amfani da wato mai kyau, sun ga aikin mai kyau a kan yin rarraba a tsakanin harshen wanda aka samar da wasu masu tsaron da ke sani, da waɗanda ke da jiran Alzheimar (AD). Haƙĩƙa, masu tambayar sun zauna bayan awon su iya gabatar da su ƙaranci mafi ƙaranci matsayin mazaɓa da ake samu-bayan tafarki. Kama wata shida wa masu daidaita parameteri da shirya, za'a buƙata wata hanyor node wanda aka yi amfani da shi a gaba-wa'asar DL (GPT-2) a kan littãfin Ingiriya na ɗabi'a da wani sigar da aka rubutu da shi hannunsa ko da hannu na rubutu (GPT-D), dõmin ya ƙidãya rabo tsakanin waɗannan misãlai biyu ''. Wannan technci yana kusantar da halin-mai-sanar kan data na matsayi daga wani mai amfani da zane-zane-zane ɗin 'Cooki Teft' na yi amfani da, kuma yana sami'ar da ba'a daidaita ba, yana ƙarai da mazaɓa masu farat ɗaya. Furan haka, GPT-D yana ƙara matsayin da aka sani ana haɗa da AD, kuma yana nuna fara na fassarar linguistic da ke da danganta ta. Kayan karatunmu ne ta wajen mafiya fahimci ga mazaɓa tsakanin aikin da ke cikin littafin da ke ƙarani da misãlai na harshen neura, da harshen da suke samar da shi, da musamman masu ƙaranci ga mutane da sifatin harshe.", 'sk': 'Tehnike globokega učenja (DL), ki vključujejo natančno nastavitev velikega števila parametrov modela, so zagotovile impresivno uspešnost pri razlikovanju med jezikom, ki ga proizvajajo kognitivno zdravi posamezniki, in tistimi z Alzheimerjevo boleznijo (AD). Vendar ostajajo vprašanja o njihovi sposobnosti posploševanja preko majhnih referenčnih nizov, ki so javno dostopni za raziskave. Kot alternativa neposrednemu prilagajanju parametrov modela predlagamo novo metodo, s katero se model transformatorja DL (GPT-2), ki je predhodno usposobljen za splošno angleško besedilo, združi z umetno degradirano različico samega sebe (GPT-D), da se izračuna razmerje med tema dvema modeloma\\textit{perplexities} o jeziku kognitivno zdravih in okvarjenih posameznikov. Ta tehnika pristopa k najsodobnejši predstavi besedilnih podatkov iz široko uporabljene naloge opisa slike "kraje piškotkov", za razliko od uveljavljenih alternativ pa se dobro posploši tudi spontanim pogovorom. Poleg tega GPT-D ustvarja besedilo z značilnostmi, za katere je znano, da so povezane z AD, kar dokazuje indukcijo z demenco povezanih jezikovnih anomalij. Naša študija je korak k boljšemu razumevanju odnosov med notranjim delovanjem generativnih nevronskih jezikovnih modelov, jezikom, ki ga proizvajajo, in škodljivimi učinki demence na značilnosti govora in jezika človeka.', 'bo': "Deep learning (DL) techniques involving fine-tuning large numbers of model parameters have delivered impressive performance on the task of discriminating between language produced by cognitively healthy individuals, and those with Alzheimer's disease (AD). ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་མང་གིས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པར་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་། As an alternative to fitting model parameters directly, we propose a novel method by which a Transformer DL model (GPT-2) pre-trained on general English text is paired with an artificially degraded version of itself (GPT-D), to compute the ratio between these two models' \\textit{perplexities} on language from cognitively healthy and impaired individuals. དངོས་གནས་སྟངས་འདིས་རྩལ་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཆོག་ཡིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་སྐྱོང་བ་དང་། དེ་མིན་ཡང་། GPT-D་ནི་AD་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད། སྐྱེས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐྱེས་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ནི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བའི་རིགས་ཤིག་ཏུ་གྲལ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Entity-based Neural Local Coherence Modeling', 'es': 'Una encuesta empírica sobre la eficacia de las técnicas de desvío para modelos de lenguaje preentrenados', 'ar': 'مسح تجريبي لفعالية تقنيات إزالة الحيازة لنماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا', 'fr': "Une enquête empirique sur l'efficacité des techniques de débiaisage pour les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés", 'pt': 'Uma Pesquisa Empírica da Eficácia das Técnicas de Debiasing para Modelos de Linguagem Pré-treinados', 'ja': '事前に訓練された言語モデルのための偏向テクニックの有効性の実証的調査', 'zh': '预训语言依式去偏倚有效性之实', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल के लिए Debiasing तकनीकों की प्रभावशीलता का एक अनुभवजन्य सर्वेक्षण', 'ru': 'Эмпирический обзор эффективности методов дебиасинга для предварительно обученных языковых моделей', 'ga': 'Suirbhé Eimpíreach ar Éifeachtúlacht Teicnící Díchlaonta do Mhúnlaí Teanga Réamhoilte', 'ka': 'ევბიზაციის ტექნექციების ეფექტიურობის ამოვრიკალური მონაცემები წავლის მოდელებისთვის', 'hu': 'Az előképzett nyelvi modellekre vonatkozó vizsgálati technikák hatékonyságának empirikus felmérése', 'el': 'Εμπειριακή έρευνα για την αποτελεσματικότητα των τεχνικών απομάκρυνσης για προσχεδιασμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα', 'it': "Un'indagine empirica sull'efficacia delle tecniche di debiasing per modelli linguistici pre-formati", 'lt': 'Empiriška išankstinio mokymo kalbų modelių apžvalga', 'mk': 'Империска истрага за ефективноста на техниките за дебизација за предобучени јазички модели', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгілерінің Debiasing техникаларының эффективнігін империкалық зерттеу', 'ms': 'An Empirical Survey of the Effectiveness of Debiasing Techniques for Pre-trained Language Models', 'mt': 'Stħarriġ Impiriku dwar l-Effikaċja tat-Tekniki ta’ Debijar għal Mudelli Lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡെബിയാസിങ്ങ് ടെക്നിക്കുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവിയുടെ സാക്ഷ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഒര', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загваруудын Debiasing техникийн эффективностын эзэмшил судалгаа', 'pl': 'Empiryczny przegląd skuteczności technik debiazing dla wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych', 'ro': 'Un studiu empiric al eficacității tehnicilor de debiazare pentru modele lingvistice pre-instruite', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'An Empirical Survey of Effective of Debiasing Techniques for Pre-trained Models', 'sr': 'Impiričko istraživanje učinkovitosti Debiasing tehnike za predobučene jezičke modele', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளுக்கான தொழில்நுட்ப தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் விளைவுகளின் விளைவு', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En empirisk undersökning av effektiviteten hos Debiasing Tekniker för förberedda språkmodeller', 'ur': 'پیش تعلیم کی زبان موڈل کے لئے Debiasing تکنیک کی اثرات کے مطابق ایک عمومی تحقیق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Empirical Survey of the Effectiveness of disciasing techniquess for pre-educated language Models', 'bg': 'Емпирично изследване на ефективността на дебиазиращите техники за предварително обучени езикови модели', 'hr': 'Empiričko istraživanje učinkovitosti Debiasing tehnika za predobučene jezičke modele', 'nl': 'Een empirische enquête naar de effectiviteit van debiasing technieken voor voorgetrainde taalmodellen', 'da': 'En empirisk undersøgelse af effektiviteten af debiasing teknikker til præuddannede sprogmodeller', 'de': 'Ein empirischer Überblick über die Wirksamkeit von Debiasing-Techniken für vortrainierte Sprachmodelle', 'ko': '예비 훈련 언어의 유효성 조사', 'id': 'Survey Empirical of the Effectiveness of Debiasing Techniques for Pre-Trained Language Models', 'fa': 'یک تحقیق امپراتیکی از موثرت تکنیک\u200cهای Debiasing برای مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبان', 'sw': 'Tafiti la Utamaduni wa Effective of Debiasing Teknolojia kwa Models of Pre-trained Lugha', 'tr': 'Öňki bilim sistemleri üçin Debiasing Tehnikleriniň etkinlik barlygyny bejermek', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një sondazh perandor mbi efektshmërinë e teknikave të diskutimit për modelet e gjuhës të trajnuara para', 'am': 'An Empirical Survey of the Effectiveness of Debiasing Techniques for Pre-trained Language Models', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելների դեբիզացիայի տեխնոլոգիաների արդյունավետության կայսրական հետազոտությունը', 'bn': 'প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষা মোডেলের জন্য ডেবিয়াজিং প্রযুক্তির প্রভাবের একটি সামার্ভিক জরিপ', 'bs': 'Empiričko istraživanje učinkovitosti Debiasing tehnika za predobučene jezičke modele', 'az': 'Ön təhsil edilmiş Dil Modelləri üçün Debiasing Tehniklərinin Efektivitəti', 'cs': 'Empirický průzkum efektivity debiasingových technik pro předškolené jazykové modely', 'ca': "Un estudi empíric sobre l'eficiència de les tècniques de debaixament dels models de llenguatge pré-entrenats", 'et': 'Eelkoolitud keelemudelite debateerimistehnikate efektiivsuse empiiriline uuring', 'fi': 'Empiirinen tutkimus esikoulutettujen kielimallien Debiasing Techniques -tekniikoiden vaikuttavuudesta', 'jv': '1', 'ha': 'An Empirical Sury of the Effective of Debiyasinging Technical for Pre-Training Models', 'he': 'חקירה אימפרית על היפעילות של טכניקות דיביאציה למודלים לשפה מאומנים מראש', 'sk': 'Empirična raziskava učinkovitosti tehnik debatiranja za vnaprej usposobljene jezikovne modele', 'bo': 'An Empirical Survey of the Effectiveness of Debiasing Techniques for Pre-trained Language Models'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose an entity-based neural local coherence model which is linguistically more sound than previously proposed neural coherence models. Recent neural coherence models encode the input document using large-scale pretrained language models. Hence their basis for computing local coherence are words and even sub-words. The analysis of their output shows that these models frequently compute coherence on the basis of connections between (sub-)words which, from a linguistic perspective, should not play a role. Still, these models achieve state-of-the-art performance in several end applications. In contrast to these models, we compute coherence on the basis of entities by constraining the input to noun phrases and proper names. This provides us with an explicit representation of the most important items in sentences leading to the notion of focus. This brings our model linguistically in line with pre-neural models of computing coherence. It also gives us better insight into the behaviour of the model thus leading to better explainability. Our approach is also in accord with a recent study (O’Connor and Andreas, 2021), which shows that most usable information is captured by nouns and verbs in transformer-based language models. We evaluate our model on three downstream tasks showing that it is not only linguistically more sound than previous models but also that it outperforms them in end applications.', 'ar': 'أظهر العمل الأخير أن نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا تلتقط التحيزات الاجتماعية من الكميات الكبيرة من النصوص التي تم تدريبهم عليها. وقد جذب هذا الانتباه إلى تطوير تقنيات تخفف من مثل هذه التحيزات. في هذا العمل ، نجري مسحًا تجريبيًا لخمس تقنيات مقترحة مؤخرًا لتخفيف التحيز: زيادة البيانات الواقعية (CDA) ، التسرب ، إسقاط الفراغ المتكرر ، الديبايات الذاتية ، وجمل الجمل. نحدد فعالية كل تقنية باستخدام ثلاثة معايير تحيز جوهرية بينما نقيس أيضًا تأثير هذه التقنيات على قدرة نمذجة اللغة للنموذج ، بالإضافة إلى أدائها في مهام NLU النهائية. من الناحية التجريبية ، وجدنا أن: (1) Self-Debias هي أقوى تقنية لإلغاء التشويش ، وتحصل على درجات محسّنة في جميع معايير التحيز ؛ (2) تقنيات إزالة التحيز الحالية تعمل بشكل أقل اتساقًا عند التخفيف من التحيزات غير الجنسانية ؛ و (3) التحسينات على معايير التحيز مثل StereoSet و CrowS-Pairs باستخدام استراتيجيات تصحيح الحواف غالبًا ما تكون مصحوبة بانخفاض في القدرة على نمذجة اللغة ، مما يجعل من الصعب تحديد ما إذا كان التخفيف من التحيز فعالاً أم لا.', 'fr': "Des travaux récents ont montré que les modèles linguistiques préentraînés capturent les biais sociaux liés aux grandes quantités de textes sur lesquels ils sont formés. Cela a attiré l'attention sur le développement de techniques qui atténuent ces biais. Dans ce travail, nous effectuons une étude empirique de cinq techniques d'atténuation des biais récemment proposées\xa0: l'augmentation des données contrefactuelles (CDA), le décrochage, la projection itérative dans l'espace nul, l'auto-débias et le SentenceDebias. Nous quantifions l'efficacité de chaque technique à l'aide de trois critères de biais intrinsèques tout en mesurant l'impact de ces techniques sur la capacité de modélisation du langage d'un modèle, ainsi que ses performances sur les tâches NLU en aval. Nous avons constaté expérimentalement que\xa0: (1) l'auto-débias est la technique de débiasing la plus puissante, obtenant des scores améliorés sur tous les points de référence de biais\xa0; (2) les techniques actuelles de débiaisage fonctionnent moins régulièrement lorsqu'elles atténuent les biais non sexistes\xa0; et (3) des améliorations sur les repères de biais tels que StereoSet et Crow-pairs en utilisant les stratégies de dépolarisation s'accompagnent souvent d'une diminution de la capacité de modélisation linguistique, ce qui rend difficile la détermination de l'efficacité de l'atténuation des biais.", 'es': 'Un trabajo reciente ha demostrado que los modelos lingüísticos preentrenados capturan los sesgos sociales de las grandes cantidades de texto en las que están capacitados. Esto ha llamado la atención sobre el desarrollo de técnicas que mitiguen estos sesgos. En este trabajo, realizamos una encuesta empírica de cinco técnicas de mitigación de sesgos propuestas recientemente: aumento de datos contrafácticos (CDA), abandono, proyección iterativa de espacio nulo, autodebias y sentencias Debias. Cuantificamos la eficacia de cada técnica utilizando tres puntos de referencia de sesgo intrínseco y, al mismo tiempo, medimos el impacto de estas técnicas en la capacidad de modelado del lenguaje de un modelo, así como su rendimiento en las tareas de NLU posteriores. Experimentalmente, encontramos que: (1) Self-Debias es la técnica de debiasing más fuerte, obteniendo mejores puntuaciones en todos los puntos de referencia de sesgo; (2) las técnicas actuales de debiasing funcionan de manera menos consistente al mitigar los sesgos ajenos al género; y (3) mejoras en los puntos de referencia de sesgo como StereoSet y Crows-pairs mediante el uso de las estrategias de debilitamiento suelen ir acompañadas de una disminución en la capacidad de modelar el lenguaje, lo que dificulta determinar si la mitigación del sesgo fue efectiva.', 'pt': 'Trabalhos recentes mostraram que modelos de linguagem pré-treinados capturam preconceitos sociais das grandes quantidades de texto em que são treinados. Isso atraiu a atenção para o desenvolvimento de técnicas que mitigam esses vieses. Neste trabalho, realizamos um levantamento empírico de cinco técnicas de mitigação de viés propostas recentemente: Aumento de Dados Contrafactuais (CDA), Dropout, Projeção Iterative Nullspace, Self-Debias e SentenceDebias. Quantificamos a eficácia de cada técnica usando três benchmarks de viés intrínsecos, ao mesmo tempo em que medimos o impacto dessas técnicas na capacidade de modelagem de linguagem de um modelo, bem como seu desempenho em tarefas NLU downstream. Descobrimos experimentalmente que: (1) Self-Debias é a técnica mais forte de debiasing, obtendo pontuações melhores em todos os benchmarks de bias; (2) As técnicas atuais de redução de vieses têm um desempenho menos consistente ao mitigar vieses não relacionados ao gênero; E (3) melhorias em benchmarks de viés, como StereoSet e CrowS-Pairs, usando estratégias de despolarização são frequentemente acompanhadas por uma diminuição na capacidade de modelagem de linguagem, dificultando determinar se a mitigação de viés foi eficaz.', 'hi': 'हाल के काम से पता चला है कि पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल बड़ी मात्रा में पाठ से सामाजिक पूर्वाग्रहों को कैप्चर करते हैं जिस पर उन्हें प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। इसने ऐसी तकनीकों को विकसित करने पर ध्यान आकर्षित किया है जो इस तरह के पूर्वाग्रहों को कम करते हैं। इस काम में, हम हाल ही में प्रस्तावित पांच पूर्वाग्रह शमन तकनीकों का एक अनुभवजन्य सर्वेक्षण करते हैं: प्रतिवादी डेटा वृद्धि (सीडीए), ड्रॉपआउट, पुनरावर्ती नलस्पेस प्रोजेक्शन, स्व-डेबियास, और वाक्यदिबियास। हम तीन आंतरिक पूर्वाग्रह बेंचमार्क का उपयोग करके प्रत्येक तकनीक की प्रभावशीलता को मापते हैं, जबकि मॉडल की भाषा मॉडलिंग क्षमता पर इन तकनीकों के प्रभाव को भी मापते हैं, साथ ही डाउनस्ट्रीम एनएलयू कार्यों पर इसके प्रदर्शन को भी मापते हैं। हम प्रयोगात्मक रूप से पाते हैं कि: (1) स्व-डेबियास सबसे मजबूत डिबियासिंग तकनीक है, जो सभी पूर्वाग्रह बेंचमार्क पर बेहतर स्कोर प्राप्त करती है; (2) गैर-लिंग पूर्वाग्रहों को कम करते समय वर्तमान debiasing तकनीकें कम लगातार प्रदर्शन करती हैं; और (3) पूर्वाग्रह बेंचमार्क पर सुधार जैसे स्टीरियोसेट और क्रोएस-पेयर्स डीबियासिंग रणनीतियों का उपयोग करके अक्सर भाषा मॉडलिंग क्षमता में कमी के साथ होते हैं, जिससे यह निर्धारित करना मुश्किल हो जाता है कि पूर्वाग्रह शमन प्रभावी था या नहीं।', 'zh': '近者研明,预训语言模样从其所练大文本中得世间偏见。 此开减偏见之术也。 五偏缓术,反数增(CDA),Dropout迭代空投影,Self-DebiasSent sentenceBibias。 吾以三内差准量化每术之有效性,兼测其对模型言建模能,及其下流NLU任之性。 实验曰:(1)自倚者,至强也;以偏倚者,至高之数也;以偏倚者,至高之数也。 (2)目前偏倚术,在轻非性别偏见时差。 (3)因用去偏移策于StereoSet、CrowS-Pairs等偏差之差,改进常伴语言建模力之降,使难以确定偏差有效。', 'ru': 'Недавняя работа показала, что предварительно обученные языковые модели отражают социальные предубеждения из-за большого количества текста, на котором они обучены. Это привлекло внимание к разработке методов, смягчающих такие предубеждения. В этой работе мы проводим эмпирический обзор пяти недавно предложенных методов смягчения смещения: контрафактивное увеличение данных (CDA), выпадение, итеративная проекция нулевого пространства, самодебиас  и SentenceDebias. Мы количественно оцениваем эффективность каждого метода, используя три внутренних критерия смещения, а также измеряем влияние этих методов на способность модели к моделированию языка, а также ее производительность при выполнении задач нижележащего НЛУ. Мы экспериментально обнаруживаем, что: (1) Self-Debias является самым сильным методом дебирования, получая улучшенные оценки по всем критериям смещения; (2) Текущие методы дебирования работают менее последовательно при смягчении не-гендерных смещений; и (3) улучшения критериев смещения, таких как StereoSet и CrowS-Pairs, с использованием стратегий дебирования часто сопровождаются снижением способности к языковому моделированию, что затрудняет определение того, было ли смягчение смещения эффективным.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、事前に訓練された言語モデルが、訓練された大量のテキストから社会的バイアスを取り込むことが示されています。 これは、そのようなバイアスを軽減する技術の開発に注目を集めている。 この研究では、最近提案された5つのバイアス軽減テクニックの実証調査を行います：反事実データ拡張（ CDA ）、ドロップアウト、反復ヌルスペースプロジェクション、Self - Debias、およびSentenceDebias。 私たちは、3つの固有のバイアスベンチマークを使用して各テクニックの有効性を定量化すると同時に、モデルの言語モデリング能力へのこれらのテクニックの影響、およびダウンストリームNLUタスクへのパフォーマンスを測定します。 私たちは、実験的に次のことを発見しました。（ 1 ） Self - Debiasは最も強力なデビアステクニックであり、すべてのバイアスベンチマークで改善されたスコアを得ることができます。（ 2 ）現在のデビアステクニックは、非ジェンダーバイアスを軽減するときに一貫性が低くなります。（ 3 ）デビアス戦略を使用することによるStereoSetやCrowS - Pairsなどのバイアスベンチマークの改善は、多くの場合、言語モデリング能力の低下を伴い、バイアス軽減が効果的であったかどうかを判断することが困難になります。', 'ga': 'Léiríonn obair a rinneadh le déanaí go n-éiríonn le samhlacha teanga réamh-oilte laofachtaí sóisialta a bhaint as an méid mór téacs a bhfuil siad oilte orthu. Tharraing sé seo aird ar theicnící a fhorbairt a mhaolaíonn na laofachtaí sin. San obair seo, déanaimid suirbhé eimpíreach ar chúig theicníc maolaithe claonta a moladh le déanaí: Méadú Sonraí Frithfhíorasach (CDA), Dropout, Teilgean Atrialach Neamhspáis, Féin-Déimheas, agus Pianbhreith Debias. Déanaimid éifeachtúlacht gach teicníochta a chainníochtú trí úsáid a bhaint as trí thagarmharcanna claonta intreacha agus ag an am céanna tomhas a dhéanamh ar thionchar na dteicnící sin ar chumas samhaltaithe teanga na samhla, chomh maith lena fheidhmíocht ar thascanna iartheachtacha NLU. Faighimid amach go turgnamhach: (1) Is é Self-Debias an teicníocht díchlaonta is láidre, ag baint amach scóir feabhsaithe ar gach tagarmharc laofachta; (2) Is lú comhsheasmhach a fheidhmíonn na teicníochtaí díchlaontachta atá ann faoi láthair nuair a dhéantar laofachtaí neamh-inscne a mhaolú; Agus (3) is minic go mbíonn laghdú ar chumas samhaltaithe teanga ag gabháil le feabhsuithe ar thagarmharcanna laofachta amhail StereoSet agus CrowS-Pairs trí úsáid a bhaint as straitéisí díchlaonta, rud a fhágann go bhfuil sé deacair a chinneadh an raibh an maolú laofachta éifeachtach.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi munkák azt mutatták, hogy az előkészített nyelvi modellek nagy mennyiségű szövegből rögzítik a társadalmi előítéleteket. Ez felhívta a figyelmet az ilyen előítéletek enyhítésére szolgáló technikák fejlesztésére. Ebben a munkában öt nemrégiben javasolt elfogultság-enyhítési technikát végeztünk empirikus felméréssel: hamisított adatok bővítése (CDA), cseppentés, iteratív nullspace vetítés, öndebiák és SentenceDebias. Az egyes technikák hatékonyságát három intrinsec bias referenciaérték segítségével számszerűsítjük, miközben mérjük ezeknek a technikáknak a modellek nyelvi modellezési képességére gyakorolt hatását, valamint annak teljesítményét a downstream NLU feladatokra. Kísérleti módon megállapítjuk, hogy: (1) Az Self-Debias a legerősebb debiasing technika, amely minden bias referenciaértéken javított pontszámokat ér el; (2) A jelenlegi lebontási technikák kevésbé következetesen teljesítenek a nemek közötti elfogultságok enyhítésében; És (3) az elfogultsági referenciaértékek, mint például a StereoSet és a CrowS-Pairs diszkriminációs stratégiák alkalmazásával történő fejlesztése gyakran kíséri a nyelvmodellezési képességek csökkenését, ami megnehezíti annak megállapítását, hogy az elfogultság enyhítése hatékony-e.', 'it': "Recenti lavori hanno dimostrato che modelli linguistici pre-formati catturano i pregiudizi sociali dalle grandi quantità di testo su cui sono addestrati. Questo ha attirato l'attenzione sullo sviluppo di tecniche che mitigano tali pregiudizi. In questo lavoro, eseguiamo un'indagine empirica su cinque tecniche di mitigazione dei bias recentemente proposte: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias e SentenceDebias. Quantifichiamo l'efficacia di ogni tecnica utilizzando tre parametri di bias intrinseci, misurando anche l'impatto di queste tecniche sulla capacità di modellazione del linguaggio di un modello, così come le sue prestazioni sulle attività NLU a valle. Scopriamo sperimentalmente: (1) Self-Debias è la tecnica di debiasing più forte, ottenendo punteggi migliorati su tutti i benchmark di bias; (2) Le attuali tecniche di debiasing hanno risultati meno coerenti nel mitigare i pregiudizi non di genere; E (3) i miglioramenti sui benchmark di bias come StereoSet e CrowS-Pairs utilizzando strategie di debiasing sono spesso accompagnati da una diminuzione della capacità di modellazione del linguaggio, rendendo difficile determinare se la mitigazione del bias fosse efficace.", 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εργασίες έχουν δείξει ότι τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα συλλαμβάνουν κοινωνικές προκαταλήψεις από τις μεγάλες ποσότητες κειμένου στο οποίο εκπαιδεύονται. Αυτό έχει προσελκύσει την προσοχή στην ανάπτυξη τεχνικών που μετριάζουν τέτοιες προκαταλήψεις. Σε αυτή την εργασία, διεξάγουμε μια εμπειρική έρευνα πέντε πρόσφατα προτεινόμενων τεχνικών μετριασμού της προκατάληψης: Αύξηση πλαστών δεδομένων (Επεκτίμηση πλαστών δεδομένων, Πτώση, Επαναστατική Προβολή μηδενικού χώρου, Αυτο-Συζητήσεις και Καταδικάσεις. Καταγράφουμε ποσοτικά την αποτελεσματικότητα κάθε τεχνικής χρησιμοποιώντας τρεις εγγενείς δείκτες αναφοράς προκατάλειψης ενώ μετράμε επίσης τον αντίκτυπο αυτών των τεχνικών στην ικανότητα γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης ενός μοντέλου, καθώς και την απόδοσή του σε μεταγενέστερες εργασίες NLU. Πειραματικά διαπιστώνουμε ότι: (1) Η αυτο-συζήτηση είναι η ισχυρότερη τεχνική αποπροσανατολισμού, επιτυγχάνοντας βελτιωμένες βαθμολογίες σε όλα τα σημεία αναφοράς προκατάλειψης. (2) Οι τρέχουσες τεχνικές απομάκρυνσης αποδίδουν λιγότερο συνεπή αποτελέσματα κατά τον μετριασμό των προκατειλημμένων μη φύλων· Και (3) οι βελτιώσεις σε δείκτες αναφοράς προκατάλειψης όπως το StereoSet και τα ζεύγη με τη χρήση στρατηγικών απομάκρυνσης συνοδεύονται συχνά από μείωση της ικανότητας γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης, καθιστώντας δύσκολο να προσδιοριστεί εάν η άμβλυνση της προκατάλειψης ήταν αποτελεσματική.', 'ka': 'ახლა სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო ენის მოდელები ჩვენებენ საზოგადო მუშაო ტექსტის დიდი ზომიდან. ეს აღმოჩენა აღმოჩენება ტექნოგიების განვითარებაზე, რომლებიც ასეთი წარმოდგენების შემცირებას. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ თმორიკალური განსხვავება ხუთი მხოლოდ მოწყვეტილი განსხვავება ტექნოგიების განსხვავება: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias, და SentenceDebias. ჩვენ ყველა ტექნექტიკის ეფექტიურობის კვანტიფიკაციას გამოყენებთ სამი ინტერნექტიური ბენქმარი, როგორც ამ ტექნექტიკების ეფექტის მოდექტის მოდექტის მოდექტის მოდექტის შესაძლებლობაზე, და მისი ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტიურად აღმოჩნეთ, რომ: (1) Self-Debias არის ყველაზე ძალიან დებიზაციის ტექნოგია, რომელიც ყველა ბეიზაციის ბენქმარისზე უფრო მეტი წარმოიქმნა (2) მიმდინარე დებიზაციის ტექნოგიები უფრო კონსტენსტურად გავაკეთებენ, როდესაც არ არის გენესტური წარმოდგენების შემცირება; (3) უფრო უფრო მეტადება მაგალითად, როგორც StereoSet და CrowS-Pairs გამოყენებით სტრატიგიების გამოყენებით, ბევიზაციის სტრატიგიების გამოყენებით ბევიზაციის შესაძლებლობა დამატებული ენის მოდელურის შესაძლებლობა, რომე', 'lt': 'Neseniai atliktas darbas parodė, kad iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai atspindi socialinius nukrypimus nuo didelio jų parengto teksto kiekio. This has attracted attention to developing techniques that mitigate such biases.  In this work, we perform an empirical survey of five recently proposed bias mitigation techniques: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias,  and SentenceDebias.  Kiekvieno metodo veiksmingumą vertiname naudojant tris vidinius pusiausvyros rodiklius, taip pat vertiname šių metodų poveikį modelio kalbų modeliavimo gebėjimui ir jo veiksmingumą tolesnėms NLU užduotims. Eksperimentiškai nustatome, kad: (1) Self-Debias yra stipriausias debiterizavimo metodas, užtikrinantis geresnius visų pusiausvyrinių lyginamųjų rodiklių rezultatus; (2) dabartiniai debesijos mažinimo metodai yra mažiau nuoseklūs mažinant ne lyčių pusiausvyrą; Ir (3) pagerinti sąžiningumo lyginamuosius rodiklius, pavyzdžiui, StereoSet ir CrowS-Pairs, taikant debesijos strategijas dažnai lydi kalbų modeliavimo gebėjimų sumažėjimas, todėl sunku nustatyti, ar sąžiningumo mažinimas buvo veiksmingas.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешната работа покажа дека предобучените јазички модели ги заземаат социјалните предрасуди од големите количини на текст на кои се обучени. Ова привлече внимание на развојот на техники кои ги намалуваат ваквите предрасуди. Во оваа работа, спроведуваме емпиричко истражување на пет неодамна предложени техники за намалување на предрасудите: лажно зголемување на податоците (ЦДА), дропут, итеративна нуклеарна вселенска проектива, Самодебиас и SentenceDebias. Ние ја квантификуваме ефективноста на секоја техника користејќи три внатрешни параметри за предрасуди, истовремено мерејќи го влијанието на овие техники на способноста на моделирање на јазиците на моделот, како и неговата резултат на понатамошните задачи на НЛУ Експериментално откриваме дека: (1) Самодебијас е најсилната техника на дебизација, добивајќи подобри резултати на сите параметри; (2) Сегашните техники за дебизација работат помалку константно кога се намалуваат непријатностите на половите; And (3) improvements on bias benchmarks such as StereoSet and CrowS-Pairs by using debiasing strategies are often accompanied by a decrease in language modeling ability, making it difficult to determine whether the bias mitigation was effective.', 'mt': "Xogħol reċenti wera li mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel jaqbdu pre ġudizzji soċjali mill-ammonti kbar ta’ testi li huma mħarrġa fuqhom. Dan ġibed l-attenzjoni għall-iżvilupp ta’ tekniki li jtaffu tali preġudizzji. F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu stħarriġ empiriku ta’ ħames tekniki ta’ mitigazzjoni tal-preġudizzji proposti reċentement: Aġġustament tad-Dejta Falsifikata (CDA), Dropout, Proġettazzjoni Iterattiva tal-Ispazju Null, Self-Debias, u SentenceDebias. Aħna nikkwantifikaw l-effettività ta’ kull teknika billi nużaw tliet punti ta’ riferiment intrinsiċi ta’ preġudizzju filwaqt li nikkejlu wkoll l-impatt ta’ dawn it-tekniki fuq il-kapaċità ta’ mudellar lingwistiku ta’ mudell, kif ukoll il-prestazzjoni tiegħu fuq kompiti downstream tal-NLU. Aħna nsibu esperimentalment li: (1) Self-Debias hija l-aktar teknika qawwija ta' debizzar, li tikseb punteġġi mtejba fuq il-punti ta' riferiment bias kollha; (2) It-tekniki attwali tad-debizzar iwettqu inqas konsistentement meta jittaffew il-preġudizzji mhux tas-sessi; U (3) it-titjib fil-parametri referenzjarji ta’ preġudizzju bħall-StereoSet u CrowS-Pairs bl-użu ta’ strateġiji ta’ debizzar ta’ spiss ikun akkumpanjat minn tnaqqis fil-kapaċit à ta’ mudellar tal-lingwi, li jagħmilha diffiċli li jiġi ddeterminat jekk il-mitigazzjoni tal-preġudizzju kinitx effettiva.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы жұмыс алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілері олардың оқылған үлкен мәтіндерінен әлеуметтік тәртіпсіздерді алдын алады. Бұл бұл тәртіптерді көшірмелейтін техникаларды жасау үшін қызықты болды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бұл бес жаңа ұсынылған тәжірибелерді көшірмелеу технологияларды империялық зерттеу жасадық: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias, және SentenceDebias. Біз әрбір техниканың үш ішінде тәжірибесін қолдану үшін, осы техникалардың үлгі моделлеу мүмкіндіктеріне, NLU тапсырмалардың төменгі істеу мүмкіндіктеріне және істеу мүмкіндігін өлшеміміз. Біз тәжірибелікті түсіндік: (1) Өзіміздің дебиясы - ең күшті дебияциялау техникалық, барлық бақылау бақыламаларындағы жақсы нәтижелерді жақсы түсіндіру. (2) Назардағы дебияциялау техникалары гендерлік емес тәртіптерді көшірмелеу кезінде тәртіпсіздік істейді; Және (3) StereoSet және CrowS-Pairs секілді бағыттау стратегияларын қолдану арқылы тілдерді моделу мүмкіндігін азайту үшін көбірек болады. Бұл бағыттау мүмкіндігін шектеу мүмкіндігін анықтау қиын болады.', 'ms': 'Recent work has shown pre-trained language models capture social biases from the large amounts of text they are trained on.  Ini telah menarik perhatian kepada pembangunan teknik yang mengurangi biases seperti itu. Dalam kerja ini, kami melakukan penyelidikan empirik lima teknik penyelesaian bias yang baru-baru ini direncanakan: Pembesaran Data palsu (CDA), Dropout, Projeksi Ruang Null Iteratif, Self-Debias, dan SentenceDebias. Kita kuantifikasikan keefektivitas setiap teknik menggunakan tiga tanda referensi bias intrinsik sementara juga mengukur kesan teknik ini pada kemampuan model bahasa, serta prestasinya pada tugas NLU turun. Kami secara eksperimen mendapati bahawa: (1) Self-Debias adalah teknik debiasing yang paling kuat, mendapatkan skor yang lebih baik pada semua tanda referensi bias; (2) Teknik debiasing semasa melakukan kurang konsisten apabila mengurangi biases bukan-jenis; Dan (3) peningkatan pada tanda referensi bias seperti StereoSet dan CrowS-Pairs dengan menggunakan strategi debiasing sering disertai oleh kurangnya kemampuan model bahasa, yang membuat ia sukar untuk menentukan sama ada peningkatan bias berkesan.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അവര്\u200dക്ക് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d മുളപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d വളര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന് ഇത് ശ്രദ്ധ പ് ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d അടുത്തുചേര്\u200dന്ന അഞ്ചു പ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ പ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു മോഡലിന്റെ ഭാഷ മാതൃകയുടെ പ്രഭാവം മാറ്റുന്നതിനും അതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം NLU ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും താഴെ പ്രവൃത്തിയുമായി എല്ലാ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെയും പ്രഭ നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു: (1) സ്വയം ഡെബിയസ് ഏറ്റവും ശക്തിയായ പ്രതികാരമാണ്, എല്ലാ ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളിലും മെച്ചപ്പെട് (2) നിലവിലുള്ള ഡീബസിങ്ങ് സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത (3) സ്റ്റീറോസെറ്റും ക്രോവ്സ്-പെയിര്\u200dസിന്റെയും ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെയും മുന്നറിയിപ്പുകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നത് ഭാഷയുടെ മാതൃകയില്\u200d മാതൃകയിലുള്ള പ്രവർത്തക', 'no': 'Nyleg har arbeidet vist føretrengte språk- modeller for å henta sosiale forsikt frå dei store mengda tekstane dei er trengte på. Dette har attrakta oppmerksomheten til utvikling av teknikk som minkar slike forsvinningar. I denne arbeida utfører vi ein empirisk undersøking av fem nyleg foreslått metodar for å mitigere bias: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias, og SentenceDebias. Vi kvantifiserer effektiviteten for kvar teknikk med tre inntrykk både benchmarker medan vi også målar effekten av desse teknikkane på språk modelleringa av eit modell, og utviklinga på NLU-oppgåver nedtrekkst. Vi finn eksperimentelt at: (1) Selv-Debias er den sterkeste debiasing-teknikken, som får forbetra poengringar på alle benchmarkane for forbetringar. (2) Gjeldande debiasing-teknikk utfører mindre konsekvent når det gjer mindre forståking av ikkje-seks-forståking; Og (3) forbedringar på forskyvingsbenchmarker som StereoSet og CrowS-Pair ved å bruka debiasing-strategiar blir ofte lagt med ein nedgang i språk-modelleringskapasiteten, som gjør det vanskeleg å bestemme om forskyvingsmålinga er effektivt.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie prace wykazały, że wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe uwzględniają uprzedzenia społeczne z dużej ilości tekstu, na którym są trenowane. Zwróciło to uwagę na opracowanie technik łagodzących takie uprzedzenia. W niniejszej pracy przeprowadzamy badanie empiryczne pięciu ostatnio proponowanych technik łagodzenia stronniczości: Rozszerzenie fałszywych danych (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias i SentenceDebias. Oszacowujemy skuteczność każdej techniki za pomocą trzech wewnętrznych wskaźników odniesienia stronniczego, mierząc również wpływ tych technik na zdolność modelowania języka modelu, a także jego wydajność na dalsze zadania NLU. Eksperymentalnie stwierdzamy, że: (1) Self-Debias jest najsilniejszą techniką debiatingu, uzyskującą lepsze wyniki we wszystkich punktach odniesienia stronniczości; (2) Obecne techniki debatyzacji działają mniej konsekwentnie podczas łagodzenia uprzedzeń niezwiązanych z płcią; I (3) ulepszeniu wskaźników odniesienia do stronniczości, takich jak StereoSet i CrowS-Pairs poprzez zastosowanie strategii debiating, często towarzyszy spadek zdolności modelowania języka, co utrudnia określenie, czy łagodzenie stronniczości było skuteczne.', 'ro': 'Lucrările recente au arătat că modelele lingvistice pre-instruite captează prejudecățile sociale din cantitățile mari de text pe care sunt instruite. Acest lucru a atras atenția asupra dezvoltării de tehnici care atenuează astfel de prejudecăți. În această lucrare, efectuăm un studiu empiric asupra a cinci tehnici de atenuare a prejudecăților propuse recent: Mărirea Datelor Contrafăcute (CDA), Dropout, Proiecția Iterativă Nullspace, Self-Debias și SentenceDebias. Cuantificăm eficacitatea fiecărei tehnici utilizând trei repere intrinsece de polarizare, măsurând, de asemenea, impactul acestor tehnici asupra capacității de modelare a limbajului unui model, precum și performanța acestuia asupra sarcinilor NLU din aval. Experimental constatăm că: (1) Self-Debias este cea mai puternică tehnică de debiasing, obținând scoruri îmbunătățite pe toate criteriile de bias; (2) Tehnicile actuale de debiasing au performanțe mai puțin consecvente atunci când atenuează prejudecățile non-gen; Și (3) îmbunătățirile referitoare la criteriile de prejudecată precum StereoSet și CrowS-Pairs prin utilizarea strategiilor de debiasing sunt adesea însoțite de o scădere a capacității de modelare a limbajului, făcând dificilă determinarea dacă atenuarea prejudiciată a fost eficientă.', 'so': 'Shaqoda la soo dhowaaday waxay muuqatay tusaalooyin luuqada horay loo tababaray oo ay ka qabsadaan iskaashatada bulshada ee laga soo baray qoraal tiro badan. Tani waxay u tilmaamay taqsiir horumarinta dhaqdhaqaaqa qalabka ku saxeeya khiyaanada caynkaas ah. Shaqadan, waxaynu sameynaa baaritaan la soo jeeday shan qaabab oo la soo jeeday bias mitigation: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias, and SentenceDebias. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa awoodda qaababka muusikada afka modellka, sidoo kale sameynta sameynta hawlaha hoose ee NLU. Imtixaanka waxaan helnaa in:(1) Self-Debias waa teknikada aad u xoogaysan ee qalloocsiga, waxayna heli karaan qiimaha horumarinta oo ku saabsan dhamaan waxyaabaha la sameeyo; (2) Teqooyinka habaarka ee joogta ah waxay sameyn kartaa si ka yar marka lagu isticmaalo tababarada aan jinsiga ahayn; (3) Horumarinta qoraalka baahida ah, tusaale ahaan StereoSet iyo CrowS-Pairs, waxaa marar badan ku socda qorshaha qalabka daboolka, waxaana ka dhiganaya in ay ku adag tahay inay ogaato in tababarida daboolka.', 'mn': 'Саяхан ажлын дасгал хөгжүүлсэн хэл загварууд нь нийгмийн ойлголтыг сургалтын маш их хэмжээний хэмжээнд авдаг. Энэ нь ийм урвалыг багасгах технологийг хөгжүүлэхэд анхаарал татсан. Энэ ажлын тухай бид саяхан таван шинэ санал дэвшүүлсэн бэрхшээлийн хатуу багасгах технологийг судалсан: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias, болон SentenceDebias. Бид эдгээр техник бүрийн үр дүнг загварын загварын загварын чадварын үр дүнг хэмжээгээр хэмжээгээр хэмжээгээр хэмжээнэ. Мөн NLU ажлын доорх үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг нь хэмжээнэ. Бид туршилтын хувьд (1) Өөрийгөө-Дебиас бол хамгийн хүчирхэг дэвшүүлэх техник юм. Бүх зайлшгүй байдал дээр улам сайжруулсан оноо авч ирсэн. (2) Өнөөдөр суурилуулах техник нь гендер биш байдлыг багасгах үед бага байдаг. Тэгээд (3) StereoSet болон CrowS-Pairs зэрэг багасгал багасгал хөгжүүлэх стратегийг ашиглаж хэл загварын загварын чадварыг багасгаж байна. Энэ загварын багасгал нь үр дүнтэй эсэхийг тодорхойлох нь хэцүү.', 'sr': 'Nedavni rad pokazao je predobučene jezičke modele koji uhvate socijalne predrasude od velike količine teksta na kojima su obučeni. To je privlačilo pažnju na razvoj tehnika koje smanjuju takve predrasude. U ovom poslu obavljamo empiričko istraživanje pet nedavno predloženih tehnika za smanjenje pristrasnosti: povećanje podataka protiv faktora (CDA), dropout, Iterativno Nullspace Projekcije, Self-Debias i SentenceDebias. Mi kvantificiramo učinkovitost svake tehnike koristeći tri uvrnutne kritike predrasude, istovremeno mjerenje utjecaja tih tehnika na modelnu sposobnost jezika, kao i njegovu učinkovitost na zadatak NLU. Eksperimentalno otkrivamo da je Self-Debias najjača tehnika debijacije, dobivanje poboljšanih rezultata na svim predrasudama; (2) Trenutne tehnike debijazije čine manje konsekventno kada smanjuju nepodnošne predrasude; I (3) poboljšanja predrasude kao što su StereoSet i CrowS-Pairs koristeći debijazne strategije često se prate smanjenjem sposobnosti modeliranja jezika, čineći teško utvrditi da li je smanjenje predrasude efikasno.', 'si': 'අලුත් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩල් සාමාජික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අල්ලගන්න පුළ මේක අවධානය කරලා තියෙනවා ඒ වගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩු කරනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ: කොන්ටර්ෆේල් දත්ත ආග්\u200dරීක්ෂණය (CDA), ඩ්\u200dරොප අපි හැම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් තුනක් භාවිත විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒවගේම මොඩේල්ගේ භාෂා අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් හොයාගන්නවා ඒක: (1) ස්වයංග-ඩෙබියාස් තමයි ශක්තිමත් දෙබියාස් තාක්ෂණය, හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම බෙන්ච (2) ප්\u200dරස්තූත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරවේශයේ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරවේශය නැති ජීවිත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරවේශය නැති විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න ඒ වගේම (3) ස්ටෙරියෝස් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වලින් ස්ටෙරියෝස් සහ CrowS-Pairs වලින් ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් භාවිතා කරන්න බැරි විදියට සාමාන්\u200d', 'sv': 'Nyligen har det visat sig att färdigutbildade språkmodeller fångar sociala fördomar från den stora mängd text de utbildas på. Detta har uppmärksammats på att utveckla tekniker som mildrar sådana fördomar. I detta arbete genomför vi en empirisk undersökning av fem nyligen föreslagna bias mitigation tekniker: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterativ Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias och SentenceDebias. Vi kvantifierar effektiviteten av varje teknik med hjälp av tre inneboende bias benchmarks samtidigt som vi mäter effekten av dessa tekniker på en modells språkmodelleringsförmåga, liksom dess prestanda på nedströms NLU-uppgifter. Vi finner experimentellt att: (1) Self-Debias är den starkaste debiasing tekniken, erhåller förbättrade poäng på alla bias benchmarks; (2) Nuvarande metoder för nedvärdering fungerar mindre konsekvent när det gäller att mildra icke-könsrelaterade fördomar. Och (3) förbättringar av bias benchmarks som StereoSet och CrowS-Pairs genom att använda debiasing strategier åtföljs ofta av en minskning av språkmodelleringsförmågan, vilket gör det svårt att avgöra om bias mildring var effektiv.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் பணி முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளை பிடிக்கும் பெரிய உரையிலிருந்து அவர்கள் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ள ச இவ்வாறு பிரச்சனைகளை குறைக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பங்களை உருவாக்குவதற்கு இது கவனம் ஏற்படுத்தியது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் சமீபத்தில் ஐந்து பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பியாஸ் மீட்சு துறைமுறைகளில் ஒரு உச்சரிப்பார்வை செய்கிறோம்: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Project, Self-Debia நாம் ஒவ்வொரு தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் விளைவை மூன்று உள்ளமைப்பு பியேக்குகளை பயன்படுத்தி குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் இந்த த தொழில்நுட்பத்தை மாதிரி மாதிர நாங்கள் சோதனையில் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம்: (1) சார்ந்த- டெபியாஸ் என்பது வலிமையான பிழைநீக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பம், அனைத்து பிரிவ (2) தற்போதைய பிழைநீக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தேர்வுகள் பெண்கள் இல்லாத பிரச்சனைகளை மீறும்போது குறைவாக (3) பியாஸ் பெண்ட் மற்றும் கிராவ்ஸ் பேர்கள் போன்ற பியாஸ் குறிப்புகள் முன்னேற்றங்களை பயன்படுத்தி பிழையாக்கும் திட்டங்கள் பெரும்பாலாக மொழி மாதிரி மா', 'ur': 'اچھا کام پہلے تدریس کی زبان مدل کو دکھایا گیا ہے جو ان پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے بہت بڑے ٹیکسٹوں سے اجتماعی نظریں پکڑتی ہیں۔ اس نے اس طرح کی تخصیلیوں کی تغییر کی توجه کو اٹھایا ہے جو اس طرح کی مخالفت کم کر دیتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اس کام میں پانچ اخیر سے پیش کیے ہوئے bias mitigation تکنیکیوں کی مضبوط تحقیق کی: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias، اور SentenceDebias. ہم ہر ٹیکنیک کے مطابق تین داخلی بیس بنچم مارک کے مطابق مطابق مقدار کرتے ہیں اور ان ٹیکنیکوں کی تاثیر بھی ایک مدل کی زبان نمڈلینگ قابلیت پر مقدار کرتے ہیں اور اس کی تاثیر بھی NLU کے نیچے کاموں پر ہے۔ ہم آزمائش کے طور پر یہ پاتے ہیں: (1) Self-Debias is the strongest debiasing technique, obtaining improved scores on all bias benchmarks; (2) جب جنس کے بغیر جنس کی مخالفت کو کمزور کردیتے ہیں تو اب تکنیک کمزور کرتے ہیں۔ اور (3) سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھ', 'uz': "Yaqinda ishni taʼminlovchi tildan oldin foydalanilgan modellarni bularning katta matnning ko'pchiligini qabul qiladi. Bu bir xil qo'llanmalarni o'zgartirishga qaror qiladi. Bu vazida, biz yaqinda ishlatilgan besh taʼminlov qilingan bias o'qishni bajaramiz: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Drop out, Iterative Nullspace Project, Self-Debias, va Sentence Debias. Biz har bir teknologizning effektini uchta ichki bizning qismlari bilan qo'llayapmiz. Bu teknologilarning o'zgarishlarini model modelli qobiliyatida va uning NLU vazifalarining atrofidagi amalni ko'rsamiz. Biz tasavvur qilamiz: (1) Self-Debias, hamma bias bog'lamalariga yaxshi darajalarni olish uchun eng katta deb aytish teknologidir; (2) Joriy deb hisoblash usullari jinsiyalarni kamaytirishda davom etadi; (3) Ko'paytirish strategiya yordamida, biz moslamalari uchun StereoSet va CrowS-Pairlari kabi o'zgarishlarni o'zgartirish qobiliyatiga kamaytirish juda qiyin edi.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây đã cho thấy các mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo để nắm bắt các thói xấu xã hội từ những bản thảo chúng được đào tạo. Việc này đã thu hút sự chú ý tới việc phát triển các kỹ thuật giảm thiểu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi thực hiện một nghiên cứu có kinh nghiệm về năm kỹ thuật giảm khuynh hướng gần đây đề xuất: ngược số dữ liệu tăng lên (CDO), Giảm giá, Quỹ dự án hạt, giảm giá trị tự tin, và án. Chúng tôi định lượng hiệu quả của mỗi kỹ thuật bằng ba điểm dựa trên khả năng tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ, cùng với khả năng làm việc tại dòng Ntrường. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm tìm ra rằng: 1) Self là kỹ thuật thiếu nợ lớn nhất, đạt được điểm cao trên tất cả các tiêu chuẩn thiên vị; (2) Các kỹ thuật thắt nợ hiện thời tiết tiết tiết tiết tiết giảm bớt các thói quen khác giới tính. Và (3) Sự cải tiến về tiêu thiên thạch như StereoSet và CrowS-pairs bằng cách sử dụng chiến lược làm ăn kém thường được kèm theo một sự giảm khả năng tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ, khiến khó xác định xem sự giảm bớt khuynh hướng có hiệu quả hay không.', 'bg': 'Последните изследвания показват, че предварително обучените езикови модели улавят социалните пристрастия от големите количества текст, върху които са обучени. Това привлече вниманието към разработването на техники, които смекчават подобни пристрастия. В тази работа ние извършваме емпирично проучване на пет наскоро предложени техники за смекчаване на пристрастията: увеличаване на фалшивите данни (СДА), отпадане, итеративна проекция на ядреното пространство, самодебии и присъдни дебии. Ние количествено оценяваме ефективността на всяка техника, използвайки три присъщи показатели за отклонение, като същевременно измерваме въздействието на тези техники върху способността на модела за езиково моделиране, както и изпълнението му при задачите надолу по веригата. Експериментално откриваме, че: (1) Самодебиас е най-силната техника за дебиазиране, като получава подобрени резултати по всички показатели за пристрастяване; (2) Настоящите техники за дебиазиране се представят по-малко последователно при смекчаване на различията между половете; И (3) подобренията на показателите за пристрастяване като например чрез използване на стратегии за дебиазиране често са придружени от намаляване на способността за езиково моделиране, което прави трудно да се определи дали смекчаването на пристрастията е ефективно.', 'hr': 'Skorašnji rad pokazao je predobučene jezičke modele koji uhvate socijalne predrasude od velike količine teksta na kojem su obučeni. To je privlačilo pažnju na razvoj tehnika koje smanjuju takve predrasude. U ovom poslu obavljamo empiričko istraživanje pet nedavno predloženih tehnika za smanjenje pristrasnosti: povećanje podataka protiv faktora (CDA), dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias i SentenceDebias. Mi kvantificiramo učinkovitost svake tehnike koristeći tri uvjetne mjere predrasude, istovremeno mjerenje utjecaja tih tehnika na modeliranje jezika model a modela modela modela modela modela modela modela, kao i njegove učinkovitosti na zadatke NLU-a. Eksperimentalno otkrivamo da je samostalni Debias najjača tehnika debijacije, dobivanje poboljšanih rezultata na svim predrasudama; (2) Trenutne tehnike debijacije čine manje konsekventno kad smanjuje nepodnošne predrasude; i I (3) poboljšanja na kriterima predrasude poput StereoSet i CrowS-Pairs koristeći strategije debijacije često se prati smanjenjem sposobnosti modeliranja jezika, čineći teško utvrditi je li smanjenje predrasude učinkovito.', 'da': 'Det seneste arbejde har vist, at prætrænede sprogmodeller fanger sociale fordomme fra de store mængder tekst, de er trænet i. Dette har tiltrukket opmærksomhed på at udvikle teknikker, der afbøder sådanne fordomme. I dette arbejde udfører vi en empirisk undersøgelse af fem nyligt foreslåede bias reduction teknikker: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias og SentenceDebias. Vi kvantificerer effektiviteten af hver teknik ved hjælp af tre iboende bias benchmarks, samtidig med at vi måler effekten af disse teknikker på en models sprogmodelleringsevne samt dens ydeevne på downstream NLU-opgaver. Vi finder eksperimentelt, at: (1) Self-Debias er den stærkeste debiasing teknik, der opnår forbedrede scores på alle bias benchmarks; (2) De nuværende nedbrydningsteknikker fungerer mindre konsekvent, når de afhjælper ikke-kønsmæssige fordomme Og (3) forbedringer af bias benchmarks såsom StereoSet og CrowS-Pairs ved hjælp af debiasing strategier ledsages ofte af et fald i sprogmodellering evne, hvilket gør det vanskeligt at afgøre, om bias reduktion var effektiv.', 'nl': 'Recent onderzoek heeft aangetoond dat voorgetrainde taalmodellen sociale vooroordelen vastleggen uit de grote hoeveelheden tekst waarop ze worden getraind. Dit heeft de aandacht getrokken naar het ontwikkelen van technieken die dergelijke vooroordelen verminderen. In dit werk voeren we een empirisch onderzoek uit van vijf recent voorgestelde bias mitigation technieken: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias en SentenceDebias. We kwantificeren de effectiviteit van elke techniek met behulp van drie intrinsieke bias benchmarks terwijl we ook de impact van deze technieken meten op het taalmodelleringsvermogen van een model, evenals de prestaties ervan op downstream NLU taken. Experimenteel stellen we vast dat: (1) Self-Debias de sterkste debiasing techniek is en betere scores behaalt op alle bias benchmarks; (2) De huidige debiasing technieken presteren minder consistent bij het verminderen van niet-gender vooroordelen; En (3) verbeteringen op bias benchmarks zoals StereoSet en CrowS-Pairs door gebruik te maken van debiasing strategieën gaan vaak gepaard met een afname in taalmodellering vermogen, waardoor het moeilijk is om te bepalen of de bias mitigation effectief was.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan baru-baru ini menunjukkan model bahasa terlatih awal menangkap biases sosial dari jumlah besar teks mereka dilatih. Ini telah menarik perhatian untuk mengembangkan teknik yang mengurangi biases tersebut. In this work, we perform an empirical survey of five recently proposed bias mitigation techniques: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias,  and SentenceDebias.  Kami mengukur efektif setiap teknik menggunakan tiga benchmark bias intrinsik sementara juga mengukur dampak dari teknik ini pada kemampuan model bahasa, serta prestasinya pada tugas NLU turun. Kami secara eksperimen menemukan bahwa: (1) Self-Debias adalah teknik debiasing yang paling kuat, mendapatkan skor yang lebih baik pada semua benchmark bias; (2) Teknik debiasing saat ini tidak konsisten ketika mengurangi biases bukan jenis; Dan (3) peningkatan pada benchmarks bias seperti StereoSet dan CrowS-Pairs dengan menggunakan strategi debiasing sering disertai oleh penurunan kemampuan model bahasa, membuat sulit untuk menentukan apakah bias mitigation efektif.', 'de': 'Jüngste Arbeiten haben gezeigt, dass vortrainierte Sprachmodelle soziale Vorurteile aus den großen Textmengen erfassen, auf denen sie trainiert werden. Dies hat die Aufmerksamkeit auf die Entwicklung von Techniken gelenkt, die solche Vorurteile mildern. In dieser Arbeit führen wir eine empirische Erhebung über fünf kürzlich vorgeschlagene Bias-Minderungstechniken durch: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias und SentenceDebias. Wir quantifizieren die Effektivität jeder Technik anhand von drei intrinsischen Bias Benchmarks und messen gleichzeitig den Einfluss dieser Techniken auf die Sprachmodellierungsfähigkeit eines Modells sowie seine Leistung auf nachgelagerte NLU-Aufgaben. Wir finden experimentell heraus, dass: (1) Self-Debias die stärkste Debiasing-Technik ist, die verbesserte Scores auf allen Bias Benchmarks erzielt; (2) Die derzeitigen Debiasing-Techniken funktionieren weniger konsistent, wenn es darum geht, geschlechtsfremde Vorurteile abzumildern; Und (3) Verbesserungen bei Bias-Benchmarks wie StereoSet und CrowS-Pairs durch den Einsatz von Debiasing-Strategien gehen oft mit einer Abnahme der Fähigkeit zur Sprachmodellierung einher, was es schwierig macht, festzustellen, ob die Bias-Minderung effektiv war.', 'ko': '최근 연구에 따르면 사전 훈련을 거친 언어 모델은 대량의 텍스트에서 사회적 편견을 포착할 수 있다.이런 편견을 덜어줄 기술 개발에 대한 관심이 높아지고 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 최근에 제기된 다섯 가지 편차 완화 기술에 대해 실증 조사를 실시했다. 바로 반사실 데이터 강화(CDA), 학업 중지, 제로 공간 투영, 자기 Debias와 문장 Debias이다.우리는 세 가지 내재적인 편차 기준을 사용하여 각 기술의 유효성을 계량화하는 동시에 이러한 기술이 모델 언어 모델링 능력에 미친 영향과 하위 NLU 임무에 대한 성능도 측정했다.우리는 실험에서 (1) 자기Debias는 가장 강한 Debias 기술로 모든 편차 기준에서 향상된 점수를 얻었다.(2) 비성별 편견을 완화할 때 현재의 차용 기술의 표현이 일치하지 않는다.(3) debiasing 전략을 사용하여 편견 기준을 개선한다. 예를 들어 입체집과 Crows쌍은 언어 모델링 능력이 떨어지기 때문에 편견 완화가 효과가 있는지 확인하기 어렵다.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya hivi karibuni imeonyesha mifano ya lugha iliyoendelea kutokana na upendeleo wa kijamii kutokana na makundi mengi ya maandishi yanayofundishwa nayo. Hii imevutia hisia za kuendeleza mbinu zinazochanganya upendeleo huu. Katika kazi hii, tunafanya utafiti wa utafiti wa teknolojia tano zilizopendekezwa hivi karibuni za upatikanaji wa upendeleo: Kuongeza kwa taarifa za Takwimu (CDA), Kuondolewa, Mradi wa Umoja wa Taifa wa Nyuklia, Self-Debias, na Hukumu Debias. Tunakadiria ufanisi wa kila teknolojia kwa kutumia bendera tatu za upendeleo wa ndani wakati pia tunakadiria athari za teknolojia hizi juu ya uwezo wa mifano ya lugha, pamoja na utendaji wake kwenye kazi za NLU za chini. Tunapata mtihani kwamba: (1) Self-Debias ni teknolojia yenye kutia mabadiliko makubwa zaidi, na kupata vipimo vizuri vya misingi yote ya upendeleo; (2) Teknolojia za kudanganya vibaya hivi sasa vinafanya vizuri zaidi wakati wa kupunguza upendeleo wa kijinsia; (3) Maendeleo ya misingi ya upendeleo kama vile StereoSet na Walipo wa CrowS kwa kutumia mikakati ya kudanganya mara nyingi yanaunganishwa na kupungua kwa uwezo wa kuonyesha lugha, na hivyo kufanya vigumu kutambua kama usambazaji wa upinzani ulikuwa na ufanisi.', 'tr': 'Ýakyndaky işlemler öňünden eğitilen dil nusgalarynyň sosialy biaslaryny ukyp görkezilýär. Bu ýaly biaslary azaltan teknikleriň gelişmesine üns çekdi. Bu işde, beş günlerde öňünde üýtgeden bias küçülemek teknikleriniň empirik analogyny çykýarys: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias,  we SentenceDebias . Biz her teknikiýanyň üç iç iç s üýtgeli pratik taýýarlamasyny we bu teknikiýalaryň nusgyny modelleme ukyplaryna ölçüp barýarys. Biz experimental olarak: (1) Öz Debias-yň özünden çykyş teknikidir, ähli bias benchmarklarynda gelişmiş notlary almak üçin iň güçli teknikidir. (2) Häzirki döwürme teknikleri jentiller arasyndaky faýllary azaltyp düşürip işleýär; We (3) StereoSet we CrowS-Paýlaşy ýaly bias düzlemleriniň üýtgewleri, debiýa strategiýalaryny ulanarak köplenç dil modelleýän ukyplarynyň azalyk bilen taýýarlanýar, biaslaryň azalmagy täsirli däldigini belirlemek kyn edýär.', 'fa': 'کارهای اخیرا مدل های زبانی پیش آموزش شده را نشان داده است که از مقدار بزرگی از متن آموزش داده می شوند. این توجه به توسعه تکنیک\u200cهای توسعه را جذب می\u200cکند که این تغییرات را کم می\u200cکند. در این کار، ما یک تحقیق امپراتیک از پنج تکنیک اخیرا پیشنهاده شده\u200cایم که تغییر کم کردن پیشنهاد داده\u200cایم: افزایش داده\u200cهای کنترفال (CDA), دروپوت، پروژه\u200cهای دوباره\u200cی نولفضا، خوددیبیاس، و SentenceDebias. ما فعالیت هر تکنیک را با استفاده از سه نقطه\u200cهای طبیعی داخلی مقدار می\u200cدهیم، در حالی که تاثیر این تکنیک\u200cها را بر توانایی مدلک زبان مدل اندازه می\u200cدهیم، و عملکرد آن بر وظیفه\u200cهای NLU پایین پایین اندازه می\u200cدهیم. ما در آزمایش پیدا کردیم که: (۱) خود-Debias قوی ترین تکنیک درمانی است، که در تمام نقطه\u200cهای تغییر تغییر\u200cگیری بهتر شده است. (۲) تکنیک\u200cهای فعلی تغییر تغییر دهنده در حالی که تغییر دادن تغییر جنسی را کمتر کند; و (3) توسط استراتژی\u200cهایی که با استفاده از استراتژی\u200cهای دبی\u200cآوری می\u200cکنند، توسط کاهش توانایی\u200cهای مدل\u200cآوری زبان\u200cها همراه می\u200cشوند، که آن را سخت می\u200cسازد تا تعیین کند که آیا کاهش\u200cآوری\u200cها موثر است.', 'af': "Onlangse werk het voorafgeleerde taal modele vertoon wat sosiale voorskrifte aanvang van die groot hoeveelheid teks wat hulle opgelei word. Hierdie het aandag aantrek na ontwikkeling van teknike wat sodanige voorskrifte verminder. In hierdie werk doen ons 'n empiriese ondersoek van vyf onlangs voorgestelde bias mitigation teknike: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias,  en SentenceDebias. Ons quantifiseer die effektiviteit van elke teknike met drie intrinsiese bias-benchmarke terwyl ook die effekt van hierdie teknike gemeet op 'n model se taal modellering kapasiteit, en sy uitvoering op onderstreem NLU-taak. Ons het eksperimenteel gevind dat: (1) Self-Debias is die sterkeste debiasing tekniks, wat verbeterde telling op alle bias benchmarke kry; (2) Huidige debiasing-teknike uitvoer minder konsistentlik wanneer nie-seuns-voorskrifte verminder word; En (3) verbeteringe op bias-benchmarke soos StereoSet en CrowS-Pairs deur die gebruik van debiasing-strategies word dikwels gehandel deur 'n verduur in taal modellering-kapasiteit, maak dit moeilik om te bepaal of die bias-vermindering effektief was.", 'am': 'የቀድሞው የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ማኅበራዊ ሁኔታዎችን ከጽሑፎች በታላቅ ቁጥጥር እንዲያነሡ ያሳያል፡፡ ይህም የዚህን ሁኔታዎችን የሚያጎድል ስልጣናዎችን ለመፍጠር ጥቃት አቀረበ፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ በቅርብ ዘመን የአምስት የውይይት ማስታወቂያ ጥያቄዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የኢንተርኔክኖችን የሦስት የውጤት የውይይት ብሔራዎችን በመቀበል እናካክላለን፡፡ በተፈተና እናገኘዋለን:(1) Self-Debias በጣም ብርቱ የዲባቢ ቴክክኖጂ ነው፡፡ (2) Current debiasing techniques perform less consistently when mitigating non-gender biases;  (3) የስቴሮኦስቴት እና የክሮኤስ-ፓርስ በተጠቃሚ የድምፅ ስርዓት በቋንቋ ምሳሌ ማቀናቀል በሚያሳፍር የውይይት ቤቶችን ማሻሻሻል፣ የጥያቄው ማቀናቀል በጥያቄ እንዲሆን ማረጋገጥ ጭንቅ ነው፡፡', 'hy': "Recent work has shown pre-trained language models capture social biases from the large amounts of text they are trained on.  Սա ուշադրություն է դարձրել այնպիսի տեխնոլոգիաների զարգացմանը, որոնք նվազեցնում են այդ կողմնականությունները: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք կատարում ենք էմպիրիկ հետազոտություն հինգ վերջերս առաջարկված կողմնականության նվազեցման տեխնիկաների մասին' կեղծ տվյալների աճի (CDA), ընկած, կրկնվող միջուկային պրոեկցիայի, ինքնադեբիայի և դատաստանի մասին: Մենք չափեցնում ենք յուրաքանչյուր մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը օգտագործելով երեք ներքին կողմնակի համեմատական նպատակներ, միաժամանակ չափելով նաև այս մեթոդների ազդեցությունը մոդելի լեզվի մոդելավորման ունակության վրա, ինչպես նաև դրա արդյունավետությունը ՆԼԵ-ի հետ Մենք փորձարկումներ ենք հայտնաբերել, որ: (1) Եսա-Դեբիան ամենաուժեղ նվազեցնող տեխնիկան է, որն ունի բարելավված գնահատականներ բոլոր կողմնակի հարաբերականների վրա, (2) Ներկայումս գոյություն ունեցող թուլացման տեխնիկաները ավելի քիչ համընդհանուր են արտադրում, երբ նվազեցնում են ոչ գենդերային կողմնականությունները: Եվ (3) այնպիսի կողմնակի համեմատական նշանների, ինչպիսիք են ՍտերիոՍետը և Քրոուս-Պարերը, բարելավումները, օգտագործելով թերացնող ռազմավարություններ, հաճախ ուղեկցվում են լեզվի մոդելավորման ունակության կրճատումից, ինչը դժվարանում է որոշել, արդյ", 'sq': 'Puna e fundit ka treguar se modelet e gjuhës paratrajnuar kapin paragjykime sociale nga sasitë e mëdha të tekstit në të cilët janë trajnuar. Kjo ka tërhequr vëmendjen ndaj zhvillimit të teknikave që lehtësojnë të tilla paragjykime. Në këtë punë, ne kryejmë një sondazh empirik të pesë teknikave të propozuara kohët e fundit për lehtësimin e paragjykimeve: rritja e të dhënave të rreme (CDA), Dropout, Projektimi Iterativ i hapësirës bërthamore, Self-Debias, dhe SentenceDebias. Ne kuantifikojmë efektshmërinë e çdo teknike duke përdorur tre parametra paragjykimi intrinsik ndërkohë që masojmë gjithashtu ndikimin e këtyre teknikave në aftësinë e modelimit gjuhësor të një modeli si dhe performancën e tij në detyrat e NLU-s ë. Ne eksperimentalisht gjejmë se: (1) Self-Debias është teknika më e fortë debizimi, duke marrë rezultate të përmirësuara në të gjitha parametrat paraprake; (2) Tekniket aktuale të dobësimit bëjnë më pak konsistente kur lehtësojnë paragjykimet jo-gjinore; Dhe (3) përmirësimet në parametrat paraprake të tilla si StereoSet dhe CrowS-Pairs duke përdorur strategji debiasing shpesh shoqërohen nga një ulje në aftësinë e modelimit gjuhësor, duke e bërë të vështirë të përcaktohet nëse lehtësimi paraprak ishte efektiv.', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার পূর্বে প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল প্রদর্শন করেছে যে তাদের প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে সামাজিক ভাষায় যোগায This has attracted attention to developing techniques that mitigate such biases.  এই কাজে আমরা সম্প্রতি পাঁচটি প্রস্তাবিত প্রযুক্তির প্রস্তাবিত প্রযুক্তি সম্প্রতি একটি প্রাকৃতিক জরুরি করেছি: কাউন্টারফেক্টাল ডাটা অ্যাগ্মেন্টেশন (সিডিএ), ড্রোপট আমরা প্রত্যেক প্রযুক্তির কার্যক্রম নির্ধারণ করি তিনটি অভ্যন্তরীণ ভাষা বেনম্যাক ব্যবহার করে এবং এছাড়াও মোডেলের ভাষার মডেলের ক্ষমতার উপর এই প্রযুক্তিগুলোর প্ আমরা পরীক্ষার সাথে খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে: (১) স্বাধীন দেবিয়াস হচ্ছে সবচেয়ে শক্তিশালী বিভ্রান্তিকর প্রযুক্তি, যা সকল বিভিন্ন বেন (2) বর্তমান বিভ্রান্ত প্রযুক্তিগুলো নারীদের বিভ্রান্ত করার সময় ব্যবস্থা কমে যাচ্ছে; (৩) স্টিরিওসেট এবং ক্রোয়াস-পেয়ারের মত বৈষম্যের মূল্যবোধগুলোর উপর উন্নতি প্রদান করা হয়েছে ভাষার মডেলিং ক্ষমতার মাধ্যমে প্রায়শই কমে যায়, যার ফলে এই বিভিন্ন প্রতি', 'az': 'Son işləri təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri təhsil etdikləri böyük mətnlərdən sosyal təhsil edirlər. Bu, böyük tədbirləri azaltmaq üçün tədbirləşdirilən tekniklərə dikkat çekmişdir. Bu işdə, 5 yeni təklif edilmiş bias mitigation tekniklərinin empirical survey etdik: Counterfactual Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias və SentenceDebias. Biz hər teknikin effektivliğini, modelinin modellərin modellərin qabiliyyətinə və NLU işlərinin a şağıs ındaki performansını ilə müəyyən edirik. Biz təcrübə edirik ki: (1) Öz-Debias ən qüvvətli debiasing teknikidir, bütün bias benchmarklarında daha yaxşı nöqtələr alır. (2) Hazırkı dəyişiklik teknikləri cinsi olmayan tərzlərini azaltdığında daha az sürəkli işlər edirlər; ( 3 ) StereoSet və CrowS-Pairs kimi tədbirlərin düzəltməsi, debiasing stratejilərini istifadə edərək dil modellik qabiliyyətinin azaltılması ilə birlikdə idi, tədbirlərin zəifləməsinin faydalı olub olmadığını belə çətin edər.', 'bs': 'Nedavni rad pokazao je predobučene jezičke modele koji uhvate socijalne predrasude od velike količine teksta na kojima su obučeni. To je privlačilo pažnju na razvoj tehnika koje smanjuju takve predrasude. U ovom poslu obavljamo empiričko istraživanje pet nedavno predloženih tehnika za smanjenje pristrasnosti: povećanje podataka protiv faktora (CDA), dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias i SentenceDebias. Mi kvantificiramo učinkovitost svake tehnike koristeći tri uvrnutne kritike predrasude, istovremeno mjerenje utjecaja tih tehnika na modeliranje jezika model a modela modela modela modela modela modela modela, kao i njegove učinkovitosti na potpunim zadacima NLU. Eksperimentalno otkrivamo da je samostalni Debias najjača tehnika debijacije, dobivanje poboljšanih rezultata na svim predrasudama; (2) Trenutne tehnike debijacije čine manje konsekventno kada smanjuje nepodnošne predrasude; I (3) poboljšanja na standardima predrasude poput StereoSet i CrowS-Pairs koristeći strategije debijacije često se prati smanjenjem sposobnosti modeliranja jezika, čineći teško utvrditi da li je smanjenje predrasude učinkovito.', 'cs': 'Nedávné práce ukázaly, že předškolené jazykové modely zachycují sociální zaujatosti z velkého množství textu, na kterém jsou trénovány. To upoutalo pozornost na vývoj technik, které zmírňují tyto zaujatosti. V této práci provádíme empirický průzkum pěti nedávno navržených technik zmírnění biasu: Rozšíření padělaných dat (CDA), Dropout, Iterativní Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias a SentenceDebias. Účinnost každé techniky kvantifikujeme pomocí tří vnitřních biasových referenčních měřítek a zároveň měříme vliv těchto technik na schopnost modelování jazyka a jeho výkonnost na následné NLU úlohy. Experimentálně zjišťujeme, že: (1) Self-Debias je nejsilnější debiasovací technikou, která získává lepší skóre ve všech bias benchmarkech; (2) Současné techniky odstraňování předsudků fungují méně konzistentně při zmírňování předsudků bez pohlaví; A (3) zlepšení referenčních měřítek předsudků, jako jsou StereoSet a CrowS-Pairs pomocí strategií odstraňování, jsou často doprovázeny snížením schopnosti jazykového modelování, což znamená, že je obtížné určit, zda zmírnění předsudků bylo účinné.', 'ca': "La feina recent ha demostrat que els models de llenguatge pré-entrenats capturan prejudicis socials de les grans quantitats de text en què estan entrenats. Això ha atraït l'atenció al desenvolupament de tècniques que mitiguen aquests prejudicis. En aquesta feina, fem un estudi empíric de cinc tècniques de mitigació de bias proposades recentment: augment de dades falses (CDA), Dropout, Projection Iterative Nullspace, Self-Debias, i SentenceDebias. We quantify the effectiveness of each technique using three intrinsic bias benchmarks while also measuring the impact of these techniques on a model's language modeling ability, as well as its performance on downstream NLU tasks.  Trobem experimentalment que: (1) Self-Debias és la tècnica de debització més forta, obtenint puntuacions millorades en tots els punts de referència; (2) Current debiasing techniques perform less consistently when mitigating non-gender biases;  I (3) les millores en punts de referència de bias com StereoSet i CrowS-Pairs utilitzant estratègies de debiasing sovint estan acompanyades d'una disminució de l'habilitat de modelar idiomes, dificultant determinar si la mitigació de bias era efectiva.", 'et': 'Hiljutised tööd on näidanud, et eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudelid kajastavad sotsiaalseid eelarvamusi suurest tekstikogusest, mida nad koolitavad. See on äratanud tähelepanu selliste meetodite väljatöötamisele, mis leevendavad selliseid eelarvamusi. Käesolevas töös teeme empiirilise uuringu viiest hiljuti välja pakutud erapooletuse leevendamise meetodist: võltsitud andmete suurendamine (CDA), väljalangemine, iteratiivne tuumaruumi projektsioon, eneseregulatsioonid ja kohtuotsusedribatsioonid. Me kvantifitseerime iga tehnika efektiivsust, kasutades kolme sisemise kalduvuse võrdlusnäitajat, mõõtes samal ajal nende tehnikate mõju mudeli keele modelleerimise võimele ning selle tulemuslikkust järgnevatel NLU ülesannetel. Eksperimentaalselt leiame, et: (1) Self-Debias on tugevaim debialiseerimise tehnika, saavutades paremaid tulemusi kõigil eelarvamuste võrdlusnäitajatel; (2) Praegused debiaseerimismeetodid toimivad vähem järjekindlalt sooliste erapooletuste leevendamisel; Ja (3) eelarvamuste võrdlusnäitajate, nagu StereoSet ja CrowS-Pairs, täiustamisega debialiseerimisstrateegiate abil kaasneb sageli keele modelleerimise võime vähenemine, mistõttu on raske kindlaks teha, kas eelarvamuste leevendamine oli tõhus.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että esikoulutetut kielimallit vangitsevat sosiaalisia ennakkoluuloja suurista tekstimääristä, joilla niitä koulutetaan. Tämä on herättänyt huomiota sellaisten tekniikoiden kehittämiseen, jotka lieventävät tällaisia ennakkoluuloja. Tässä työssä suoritamme empiirisen tutkimuksen viidestä äskettäin ehdotetusta bias-lieventämistekniikasta: Counterfact Data Augmentation (CDA), Dropout, Iterative Nullspace Projection, Self-Debias ja SentenceDebias. Kunkin tekniikan tehokkuuden kvantifioidaan käyttämällä kolmea luontaista bias-vertailuarvoa ja samalla mitataan näiden tekniikoiden vaikutusta mallin kielimallinnuskykyyn sekä sen suorituskykyä jatkojalostustehtävissä. Kokeellisesti toteamme, että: (1) Self-Debias on vahvin debiasing tekniikka, joka saa parempia pisteitä kaikista bias-vertailuarvoista; (2) Nykyiset debiaasitekniikat toimivat vähemmän johdonmukaisesti, kun ne lieventävät muita kuin sukupuoleen liittyviä ennakkoluuloja; Lisäksi (3) ennakkoluulojen vertailuarvojen, kuten StereoSet- ja CrowS-parien, parannuksiin debiasing-strategioiden avulla liittyy usein kielten mallintamisen kyvyn heikkeneminen, mikä vaikeuttaa sen selvittämistä, oliko ennakkoluulojen lieventäminen tehokasta.', 'jv': 'Gujaring Iki wis ana nggalakno kanggo nggawe teknik sing bisa mbelak kanggo biasane kuwi. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné gunakake cara empirhik wong limu supoyo bias menyang teknik nggawe barang nggawe barang urip bantêr: Counter-Actual data AGKT (cdA), DroPout, Iterave Nullspace Projection, Self-Debiah, " SentenceDebiah ". Awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe efekat kanggo saboh teknik nik nggambar 3 luwih (bench) Awak dhéwé éntuk panelusuran ngono: (1) Selah-Debia kuwi teknik sing paling nggawe Debia sing luwih apik dhéwé, nêmên ngerawak dhéwé luwih apik banderakan kanggo kalah lanjut sing apik dhéwé; (2) Teknik debian sing isih perbudhakan langkung sampeyan luwih akeh iso nggawe nguasai perbudhakan kuwi mau; (3) Ulihke ditambah kanggo kalagayaan kanggo klember-klember koyo stereo Set lan KrwS-Paye nganggep kuwi nggawe sistem debianing kuwi wis nguasai kapan kuwi tindakan model sing luwih apik, dadi susahe kuwi nggawe ngubah kuwi susahe perusahaan bias a', 'sk': 'Nedavno delo je pokazalo, da vnaprej usposobljeni jezikovni modeli zajemajo socialne pristranskosti iz velikih količin besedila, na katerih so usposobljeni. To je pritegnilo pozornost k razvoju tehnik, ki ublažijo takšne pristranskosti. V tem delu smo izvedli empirično raziskavo petih nedavno predlaganih tehnik za ublažitev pristranskosti: ponarejeno povečanje podatkov (CDA), opustitev, iterativna projekcija nuklearnega prostora, samodebije in obsodbe. Učinkovitost vsake tehnike kvantificiramo s tremi intrínsecos merili pristranskosti, hkrati pa merimo tudi vpliv teh tehnik na sposobnost modela jezikovnega modeliranja in njegovo uspešnost pri opravilih nižjega razvoja. Eksperimentalno ugotavljamo, da: (1) Self-Debias je najmočnejša tehnika debiaziranja, pri čemer pridobimo izboljšane rezultate na vseh merilih pristranskosti; (2) Trenutne tehnike odpravljanja odpravljanja odpravljanja odpravljanja odpravljanja spolov so manj dosledne; In (3) izboljšave referenčnih vrednosti pristranskosti, kot sta StereoSet in CrowS-Pairs z uporabo strategij debiasing, pogosto spremlja zmanjšanje sposobnosti jezikovnega modeliranja, zaradi česar je težko ugotoviti, ali je blažitev pristranskosti učinkovita.', 'he': 'העבודה האחרונה הראה שדוגמני שפת מאומנים מראש לכפות חיונים חברתיים מהכמויות הגדולות של טקסטים שהם מאומנים עליהם. זה משך תשומת לב לפיתוח טכניקות שמקלות את ההתמחות האלה. בעבודה הזאת, אנו מבצעים סקר אמפירי של חמישה טכניקות להקלת ההתמחות המוצעות לאחרונה: גידול נתונים מזויפים (CDA), דרופוט, פרוייקציה חלל גרעיני איטרטיבי, Self-Debias, וגזרת הדיביאס. אנו ממדידים את היעילות של כל טכניקה באמצעות שלושה נקודות רמזים בעצמנו למדוד גם את ההשפעה של הטכניקות האלה על יכולת הדוגמה לשפה של מודל, כמו גם את ההופעה שלה על משימות NLU מתקדמות. אנו מבחינה ניסיונית מוצאים ש: (1) דביאס עצמי היא הטכניקה החזקה ביותר של השפלה, להשיג נקודות משתפרות על כל נקודות התייחסות; (2) הטכניקות הנוכחיות של השפלה מבצעות פחות באופן קבוע כשמקלות את ההתמחות הלא-מינית; (3) השיפורים על נקודות רמזים משמעותיים כמו סטריוסט וצווארס-זוגות על ידי השימוש באסטרטגיות השתיכות הם לעתים קרובות מולווים על ידי הפחות ביכולת דוגמנית שפת, מה שמקשה לקבוע אם ההקלה המשמעותית היתה יעילה.', 'ha': "Yin aikin da aka nuna misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman tsari da su sami daga yawan matsayin da aka sanar da su. Wannan ya attract muhimmada ga taƙaitarwa masu iya ƙaranci masu haramtar wannan. Daga wannan aikin, munã iya samar wani suriyar kwamfyuta na farkon da aka buɗa biyas mitation technical: Counterfactural Data Augmentation (CDA), Deptout, Itative Nullspace Projekt, Self-Debiyas, and Penal Debiyas. Tuna ƙaddara fikanci ga kowane technical da ke amfani da misalin misalin na guda uku sami da za'a ƙaddara matsayin wannan tekinki a kan misalin misalin ayuka, da kuma aikin sa a kan taskõkin NLU. Tuna sami cẽwa: (1) Self-Debiyas ne mafiya tsananin tamko ga yin ɓarna, kana sami mafiya kyauta a kan duk bangon littãfin; @ info (3) Kayyarin gyarata a kangaran biya kamar kamar StreoSet da LowS-Pairs da ke amfani da tunakin yin ɓarna ko da yawa za'a ƙara da abincin misalin harshe, kuma ya yi ƙunci a gane cewa, ko an yi amfani da ciyarwa na haske ne.", 'bo': "འཕྲལ་གསོག་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ལ་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག འདིས་དབང་གི་ཆེད་དུ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོར་བ་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འོང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཀློག་སྟངས་ལ། We quantify the effectiveness of each technique using three intrinsic bias benchmarks while also measuring the impact of these technique s on a model's language modeling ability, as well as its performance on downstream NLU tasks. We experimentally find that: (1) Self-Debias is the strongest debiasing technique, obtaining improved scores on all bias benchmarks; and (2) ད་ལྟོའི་ནད་ཡུལ་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་ཡང་མིན་དང་སྐྱེས་མེད་པའི་ཕྱོགས་རྣམས་ཉར་གཏོང་བའི་སྐབས་སུ། གནད་དོན་དག་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་།"}
{'en': 'LinkBERT Pretraining Language Models with Document Links', 'ar': 'استكشاف وتكييف GPT الصينية مع طريقة إدخال Pinyin', 'pt': 'Explorando e adaptando a GPT chinesa ao método de entrada Pinyin', 'fr': 'Exploration et adaptation du GPT chinois à la méthode de saisie pinyin', 'es': 'Exploración y adaptación del GPT chino al método de entrada de Pinyin', 'ja': '中国語のGPTを拼音入力法に適合させる方法の探求', 'zh': '汉语GPT拼音输入法求用', 'hi': 'Pinyin इनपुट विधि के लिए चीनी GPT की खोज और अनुकूलन', 'ru': 'Изучение и адаптация китайского GPT к методу ввода Pinyin', 'ga': 'GPT na Síne a Iniúchadh do Mhodh Ionchuir Pinyin', 'el': 'Εξερεύνηση και προσαρμογή της κινεζικής στη μέθοδο εισαγωγής Pinyin', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Қытай GPT- ті Pinyin келтіру әдісіне зерттеу және адаптациялау', 'it': 'Esplorare e adattare il GPT cinese al metodo di input Pinyin', 'hu': 'A kínai GPT feltárása és adaptálása a pinyin beviteli módszerhez', 'mk': 'Истражување и адаптирање на кинескиот GPT на „ Pinyin “ вводниот метод', 'lt': 'Kinijos GPT tyrimas ir pritaikymas prie Pinyin įvedimo metodo', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് ജിപിടി എടുക്കുന്നതും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതും പിന്നിന്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് രീതിയിലേക്കു്', 'ms': 'Menjelajah dan menyesuaikan GPT Cina kepada Kaedah Input Pinyin', 'mt': 'L-esplorazzjoni u l-adattament tal-GPT Ċiniż għall-Metodu ta’ Input Pinyin', 'mn': 'Хятад GPT-г Pinyin Input Method-д судлах болон адаптер хийх', 'no': 'Utforskar og tilpassar kinesisk GPT til Pinyin- inndatametode', 'pl': 'Badanie i dostosowanie chińskiego GPT do metody wejścia Pinyin', 'ro': 'Explorarea și adaptarea GPT chinezesc la metoda de intrare Pinyin', 'so': "Qoraalka iyo Adapting Xiino GPT to 'Pinyin Input Method", 'sr': 'Ispitivanje i prilagođavanje kineskog GPT na Pinyin Input Method', 'si': 'පින්යින් ඇතුළුම් විදියට චීනි GPT විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ අනතුරු කරන්න', 'ta': 'பின்னின் உள்ளீட்டு முறையில் சீன ஜிபிடி ஏற்றுமதி மற்றும் ஏற்றுமதி செய்கிறது', 'sv': 'Att utforska och anpassa kinesisk GPT till pinyininmatningsmetod', 'ur': 'Pinyin Input Method پر چین جی پی پی ٹی کی تحقیق اور اڈپٹ کر رہا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khám phá và sửa chữa GPT Trung Quốc vào Phương pháp nhập Pinyin', 'bg': 'Изследване и адаптиране на китайския GPT към метода на въвеждане на пинин', 'nl': 'Het verkennen en aanpassen van Chinese GPT aan Pinyin Input Method', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje i prilagođavanje kineskog GPT na Pinyin input Method', 'da': 'Udforskning og tilpasning af kinesisk GPT til pinyin input metode', 'de': 'Erforschung und Anpassung der chinesischen GPT an die Pinyin-Eingabemethode', 'id': 'Menjelajah dan menyesuaikan GPT Cina ke Metode Input Pinyin', 'fa': 'توسعه و اضافه کردن GPT چینی به روش ورودی Pinyin', 'ko': '중국어 GPT가 병음 입력법에서의 탐색과 응용', 'sw': 'Utawala wa GPT wa Kichina wa Kuchunguza na Kuweka Kichina', 'tr': "Çinçe GPT'i Pinin Giriş Metini Saýlaw we Äpişgeler", 'sq': 'Shqyrtimi dhe adaptimi i GPT kinez në metodën e hyrjes Pinyin', 'af': 'Verskyn en aanpassing Sjinese GPT na Pinyin Input Metode', 'am': 'የቻይንኛ GPT ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': "√áinc…ô GPT'i Pinyin Girdi Metodisin…ô t…ôŇükil edir v…ô adapt edir", 'bn': 'চীনা জিপিটি- এ পিনিন ইনপুট পদ্ধতি খুঁজে বের করা এবং পরিবর্তন করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Ispitivanje i prilagođavanje kineskog GPT na Pinyin Input Method', 'ca': "Explorar i adaptar el GPT xinès al mètode d'entrada Pinyin", 'cs': 'Průzkum a přizpůsobení čínské GPT vstupní metodě Pinyin', 'et': 'Hiina GPT uurimine ja kohandamine Pinyini sisendmeetodiga', 'fi': 'Kiinan GPT:n tutkiminen ja mukauttaminen Pinyin-syöttömenetelmään', 'jv': 'Jejaring-jejaring lan ngejaring-jejaring-jejaring-jejaring-jejaring-jejaring-jejaring-jejaring-jejaring', 'he': 'מחקר ומתאים GPT סיני לשיטת הכניסה Pinyin', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje in prilagajanje kitajskega GPT metodi vnosa Pinyin', 'bo': 'Pinyin ནང་འཇུག་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་GPT་ལ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Language model LM pretraining captures various knowledge from text corpora helping downstream tasks However existing methods such as BERT model a single document and do not capture dependencies or knowledge that span across documents In this work we propose LinkBERT an LM pretraining method that leverages links between documents e.g. hyperlinks Given a text corpus we view it as a graph of documents and create LM inputs by placing linked documents in the same context We then pretrain the LM with two joint self supervised objectives masked language modeling and our new proposal document relation prediction We show that LinkBERT outperforms BERT on various downstream tasks across two domains the general domain pretrained on Wikipedia with hyperlinks and biomedical domain pretrained on PubMed with citation links LinkBERT is especially effective for multi hop reasoning and few shot QA +5 absolute improvement on HotpotQA and TriviaQA and our biomedical LinkBERT sets new states of the art on various BioNLP tasks +7 on BioASQ and USMLE We release our pretrained models LinkBERT and BioLinkBERT as well as code and data', 'es': 'Si bien GPT se ha convertido en el método de facto para las tareas de generación de texto, su aplicación al método de entrada de pinyin sigue sin explorarse.\nEn este trabajo, hacemos la primera exploración para aprovechar el GPT chino para el método de entrada de pinyin.\nDescubrimos que una GPT congelada logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en pinyin perfecto.\nSin embargo, el rendimiento disminuye drásticamente cuando la entrada incluye pinyin abreviado.\nUna razón es que un pinyin abreviado se puede asignar a muchos pinyin perfectos, lo que enlaza con un número aún mayor de caracteres chinos.\nMitigamos este problema con dos estrategias,\nincluido el enriquecimiento del contexto con pinyin y la optimización del proceso de capacitación para ayudar a distinguir homófonos. \nPara facilitar aún más la evaluación del método de entrada de pinyin, creamos un conjunto de datos que consta de 270 000 instancias de quince dominios.\nLos resultados muestran que nuestro enfoque mejora el rendimiento de la pinyin abreviada en todos los dominios.\nEl análisis del modelo demuestra que ambas estrategias\ncontribuyen al aumento del rendimiento.', 'ar': 'بينما أصبح GPT الأسلوب الواقعي لمهام إنشاء النص ، يظل تطبيقه على أسلوب إدخال بينيين غير مستكشف.\nفي هذا العمل ، قمنا بأول استكشاف للاستفادة من GPT الصينية لطريقة إدخال بينيين.\nنجد أن GPT المجمدة تحقق أداءً متطورًا على نظام pinyin المثالي.\nومع ذلك ، ينخفض الأداء بشكل كبير عندما تتضمن المدخلات بينيين مختصرًا.\nوالسبب هو أنه يمكن تعيين pinyin المختصر للعديد من pinyin المثالي ، والذي يرتبط بعدد أكبر من الأحرف الصينية.\nنخفف من هذه المشكلة باستراتيجيتين ،\nبما في ذلك إثراء السياق باستخدام بينيين وتحسين عملية التدريب للمساعدة في التمييز بين الهوموفون.\nلتسهيل تقييم أسلوب إدخال بينيين ، نقوم بإنشاء مجموعة بيانات تتكون من 270 ألف مثيل من خمسة عشر مجالًا.\nتظهر النتائج أن نهجنا يحسن الأداء على نظام بينيين المختصر في جميع المجالات.\nيوضح تحليل النموذج أن كلا الاستراتيجيتين\nتساهم في تعزيز الأداء.', 'pt': 'Embora o GPT tenha se tornado o método de fato para tarefas de geração de texto, sua aplicação ao método de entrada pinyin permanece inexplorada.\nNeste trabalho, fazemos a primeira exploração para alavancar o GPT chinês para o método de entrada pinyin.\nDescobrimos que um GPT congelado atinge um desempenho de última geração em pinyin perfeito.\nNo entanto, o desempenho cai drasticamente quando a entrada inclui pinyin abreviado.\nUma razão é que um pinyin abreviado pode ser mapeado para muitos pinyin perfeitos, que se ligam a um número ainda maior de caracteres chineses.\nNós mitigamos esse problema com duas estratégias,\nincluindo enriquecer o contexto com pinyin e otimizar o processo de treinamento para ajudar a distinguir homófonos.\nPara facilitar ainda mais a avaliação do método de entrada pinyin, criamos um conjunto de dados composto por 270 mil instâncias de quinze domínios.\nOs resultados mostram que nossa abordagem melhora o desempenho em pinyin abreviado em todos os domínios.\nA análise do modelo demonstra que ambas as estratégias\ncontribuem para o aumento do desempenho.', 'fr': "Alors que GPT est devenu la méthode de facto pour les tâches de génération de texte, son application à la méthode de saisie pinyin reste inexplorée.\nDans ce travail, nous faisons la première exploration à utiliser le GPT chinois pour la méthode de saisie pinyin.\nNous trouvons qu'un GPT gelé permet d'obtenir des performances de pointe sur un pinyin parfait.\nCependant, les performances diminuent considérablement lorsque l'entrée inclut un pinyin abrégé.\nL'une des raisons est qu'un pinyin abrégé peut être mappé à de nombreux pinyin parfaits, qui sont liés à un nombre encore plus grand de caractères chinois.\nNous atténuons ce problème grâce à deux stratégies\xa0:\nnotamment en enrichissant le contexte avec du pinyin et en optimisant le processus de formation pour aider à distinguer les homophones. \nPour faciliter davantage l'évaluation de la méthode de saisie pinyin, nous créons un ensemble de données composé de 270K instances provenant de quinze domaines.\nLes résultats montrent que notre approche améliore les performances du pinyin abrégé dans tous les domaines.\nL'analyse du modèle montre que les deux stratégies\ncontribuent à l'amélioration des performances.", 'ja': 'GPTはテキスト生成タスクの事実上のメソッドとなっているが、ピンイン入力メソッドへの適用については未調査のままである。\nこの研究では、ピンイン入力法に中国語のGPTを活用する最初の探索を行います。\n凍結したGPTは、完璧なピンインで最先端のパフォーマンスを実現することがわかりました。\nしかし、入力に略語の拼音が含まれているとパフォーマンスが劇的に低下します。\n略語拼音は、多くの完璧な拼音にマッピングすることができ、それがさらに多くの漢字にリンクしていることが理由です。\nこの問題を2つの戦略で軽減し、\nピンインでコンテキストを充実させ、ホモフォンを識別するのに役立つトレーニングプロセスを最適化することを含みます。 \nさらにピンイン入力法の評価を容易にするため、15のドメインから270 Kのインスタンスからなるデータセットを作成します。\n結果は、当社のアプローチがすべてのドメインの略語拼音のパフォーマンスを向上させることを示しています。\nモデル分析は、両方の戦略が\nパフォーマンスの向上に貢献します。', 'zh': '虽GPT为文本生事之法,其在拼音输入法者未得探索。\n于是首探中文GPT拼音输入法。\n吾见冷冻之GPT,得至拼音之先进也。\n然当输缩写拼音时,性能急剧下降。\n一者,一缩写之拼音,可以映众美之拼音,此与汉字相关也。\n吾以二策解之,\n以拼音丰上下文优化,以赞同音字。 \n为进拼音输入法之评,创一由15个域之27万个实数。\n结果表明,吾道益域中缩写拼音之性也。\n模分析表明,二策也\n有助于崇性能。', 'ru': 'Хотя GPT стал de-facto методом для задач генерации текста, его применение к методу ввода pinyin остается неисследованным.\nВ этой работе мы делаем первую разведку, чтобы использовать китайский GPT для метода ввода пиньинь.\nМы обнаружили, что замороженный GPT достигает самых современных показателей на идеальном пиньине.\nОднако производительность резко падает, когда вход включает в себя сокращенный пиньинь.\nПричина заключается в том, что сокращенный пиньинь может быть сопоставлен со многими совершенными пиньинь, что связано с еще большим количеством китайских иероглифов.\nМы смягчаем этот вопрос с помощью двух стратегий,\nвключая обогащение контекста пиньинем и оптимизацию процесса обучения, чтобы помочь отличить омофоны. \nЧтобы дополнительно облегчить оценку метода ввода пиньинь, мы создаем набор данных, состоящий из 270 000 экземпляров из пятнадцати доменов.\nРезультаты показывают, что наш подход улучшает производительность на сокращенном pinyin во всех доменах.\nАнализ модели показывает, что обе стратегии\nспособствуют повышению производительности.', 'hi': 'जबकि जीपीटी पाठ पीढ़ी के कार्यों के लिए वास्तविक विधि बन गया है, पिनयिन इनपुट विधि के लिए इसका आवेदन अनपेक्षित रहता है।\nइस काम में, हम पिनयिन इनपुट विधि के लिए चीनी जीपीटी का लाभ उठाने के लिए पहली खोज करते हैं।\nहम पाते हैं कि एक जमे हुए जीपीटी सही पिनयिन पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।\nहालांकि, प्रदर्शन नाटकीय रूप से गिरता है जब इनपुट में संक्षिप्त पिनयिन शामिल होता है।\nएक कारण यह है कि एक संक्षिप्त पिनयिन को कई सही पिनयिन के लिए मैप किया जा सकता है, जो चीनी वर्णों की भी बड़ी संख्या से लिंक करता है।\nहम दो रणनीतियों के साथ इस मुद्दे को कम करते हैं,\nपिनयिन के साथ संदर्भ को समृद्ध करने और होमोफोन को अलग करने में मदद करने के लिए प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया को अनुकूलित करने सहित। \nपिनयिन इनपुट विधि के मूल्यांकन को और अधिक सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए, हम पंद्रह डोमेन से 270K उदाहरणों से मिलकर एक डेटासेट बनाते हैं।\nपरिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण सभी डोमेन में संक्षिप्त पिनयिन पर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है।\nमॉडल विश्लेषण दर्शाता है कि दोनों रणनीतियों\nप्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए योगदान करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cé gur tháinig GPT chun bheith ina mhodh de-facto do thascanna giniúna téacs, tá a chur i bhfeidhm ar mhodh ionchuir pinyin fós gan iniúchadh.\nSan obair seo, déanaimid an chéad iniúchadh chun GPT na Síne a ghiaráil le haghaidh modh ionchuir pinyin.\nFeicimid go mbaineann GPT reoite amach feidhmíocht úrscothach ar pinyin foirfe.\nMar sin féin, titeann an fheidhmíocht go mór nuair a chuimsíonn an t-ionchur pinyin giorraithe.\nIs cúis leis sin gur féidir pinyin giorraithe a mhapáil chuig go leor pinyin foirfe, a nascann le líon níos mó fós de charachtair Síneacha.\nDéanaimid an cheist seo a mhaolú le dhá straitéis,\nlena n-áirítear an comhthéacs a shaibhriú le pinyin agus an próiseas oiliúna a bharrfheabhsú chun cabhrú le homafóin a idirdhealú.\nChun meastóireacht ar mhodh ionchuir pinyin a éascú tuilleadh, cruthaímid tacar sonraí ina bhfuil 270K cás ó chúig réimse déag.\nLéiríonn torthaí go bhfeabhsaítear ár gcur chuige maidir le feidhmíocht ghiorraithe pinyin thar gach réimse.\nLéiríonn anailís mhúnla go bhfuil an dá straitéis\ncur le treisiú feidhmíochta.', 'hu': 'Míg a GPT a szöveggenerálási feladatok de-facto módszerévé vált, alkalmazása pinyin beviteli módszerre továbbra is feltáratlan.', 'el': 'Ενώ η μέθοδος έχει γίνει η εκ των πραγμάτων μέθοδος για εργασίες δημιουργίας κειμένου, η εφαρμογή της στη μέθοδο εισαγωγής παραμένει ανεξερεύνητη.', 'ka': 'თუმცა GPT ტექსტის წარმოიქმნა დავალებებისთვის დეფექტო მეტი გახდება, მისი პროგრამა, რომელიც შეიქმნა მინუს წარმოიქმნა.', 'it': 'Mentre GPT è diventato il metodo de-facto per le attività di generazione di testo, la sua applicazione al metodo di input pinyin rimane inesplorata.', 'kk': 'GPT мәтін құру тапсырмаларының фактикалық әдісі болғанда, оның қолданбалары келтіру әдісіне қолдану үшін сұралмаған.', 'mk': 'И покрај тоа што ГПТ стана дефактичен метод за задачите на генерација на текст, нејзината апликација за pinyin input метод останува неиспитана.', 'ms': 'Sementara GPT telah menjadi kaedah de-fakto untuk tugas generasi teks, aplikasinya untuk kaedah input pinyin masih belum dikenalpasti.', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റ് തലമുറയുടെ ജോലികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡി ഫാക്ടോ രീതിയായിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അതിന്റെ പ്രയോഗം ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് രീതിയില', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li l-GPT sar il-metodu de facto għall-kompiti ta’ ġenerazzjoni tat-test, l-applikazzjoni tiegħu biex jiġi identifikat il-metodu ta’ input għadha mhux esplorata.', 'lt': 'Nors GPT tapo de facto tekstų kūrimo užduočių metodu, jos taikymas įvedimo metodui yra neištirtas.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy GPT stał się de-facto metodą dla zadań generowania tekstu, jego zastosowanie do metody wejścia pinyin pozostaje niezbadane.', 'mn': 'GPT текст үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлийн бодит арга болсон ч, үүнийг орлуулах арга хэрэглээнд тайлбарлахгүй байна.', 'no': 'Mens GPT er blitt de-facto-metoden for oppgåver for tekstgenerasjon, vil programmet sin til å pinina inndatametoden bli uventa.', 'ro': 'În timp ce GPT a devenit metoda de facto pentru sarcinile de generare de text, aplicarea sa la metoda de intrare pinyin rămâne neexplorată.', 'sr': 'Iako je GPT postao de-facto metod zadataka za generaciju teksta, njena aplikacija za metodu ulaska pinina ostaje neobjašnjena.', 'si': 'GPT ලිපින් සිදුවීම් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් පැත්තක් සිදුවීම් විධානය වෙනුවෙන් තියෙනවා නමුත්, ඒක ඇතුළත් විධ', 'sv': 'Även om GPT har blivit den faktiska metoden för textgenereringsuppgifter, är dess tillämpning på pinyin inmatningsmetoden fortfarande outforskad.', 'ta': '@ info: whatsthis', 'so': 'Inta lagu jiro GPT uu noqdo qaab aad u sameyso shaqada farshaxanka, codsigiisa lagu qorayo hababka input wuxuu sii jiraa mid aan shaqeyn.', 'ur': 'حالانکہ جی پی ٹی پی ٹیکسٹ پی نسل کے کاموں کے لئے نافذی طریقہ بن گیا ہے، اس کا کاروبار بن جانے کے لئے غیر انتظار ہے.', 'vi': 'Mặc dù GPT đã trở thành phương pháp thực tế cho các nhiệm vụ sản xuất văn bản, nhưng nó vẫn chưa được nghiên cứu về phương pháp nhập.', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'bg': 'Докато GPT се превърна в де-факто метод за задачи за генериране на текст, приложението му към метода за въвеждане на пинин остава неизследвано.', 'da': 'Mens GPT er blevet den faktiske metode til tekstgenerering opgaver, dens anvendelse til pinyin input metode forbliver uudforsket.', 'hr': 'Iako je GPT postao de-facto metod zadataka za proizvodnju teksta, njezina primjena na metod ulaska pinina ostaje neobjašnjena.', 'nl': 'Hoewel GPT de feitelijke methode is geworden voor tekstgenereertaken, blijft de toepassing ervan op pinyin-invoermethode onontdekt.', 'de': 'Während GPT zur De-facto-Methode für Textgenerierungsaufgaben geworden ist, bleibt seine Anwendung auf die Pinyin-Eingabemethode unerforscht.', 'id': 'Sementara GPT telah menjadi metode de-facto untuk tugas generasi teks, aplikasinya untuk pinyin metode masukan tetap belum dikeksplorasi.', 'sw': 'Wakati GPT imekuwa njia isiyo rasmi kwa ajili ya kazi za vizazi vya teknolojia, matumizi yake ya kuingia mbinu za input bado hayajatumiwa.', 'ko': 'GPT는 이미 텍스트 생성 작업의 실제 방법이 되었지만, 병음 입력법에서의 응용은 여전히 탐색할 필요가 있다.', 'sq': 'Ndërsa GPT është bërë metoda de-facto për detyrat e gjenerimit të tekstit, aplikimi i saj për pinyin metodën e hyrjes mbetet i pashetuar.', 'af': 'Alhoewel GPT die de- facto metode geword het vir teks generasie taak, bly sy toepassing om in invoer metode te pinyin onverkondig.', 'tr': 'GPT metin döredilişi täzelikleriniň faktiski yöntemi bolança, içine giriş yöntemi açmak üçin uygulamasy gaýd edilmedi.', 'am': 'GPT ለጽሑፍ ትውልድ አድራጊዎች የዶ-facto method ሲሆን፣ ፕሮግራሙን ወደ input method መግለጫ ያልተሰራ ነው።', 'fa': 'در حالی که GPT روش غیر واقعی برای کارهای تولید متن تبدیل شده است، کاربرد آن برای روش وارد پینین بی\u200cاثر است.', 'az': 'GPT məktub ürəklərinin işlərinin de-facto yöntemi olmasına rağmen, onun girdi yöntemini tapmaq üçün uyğulaması açıq deyildir.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ GPT-ը դարձավ տեքստի ստեղծման խնդիրների դե-փակտային մեթոդը, դրա կիրառումը ներմուծման մեթոդի նշանակման համար դեռևս չի ուսումնասիրել:', 'bn': 'এদিকে জিপিটি টেক্সট প্রজন্মের কাজের ডি-ফ্যাক্টো পদ্ধতিতে পরিণত হয়েছে, ইনপুট পদ্ধতি পিনাইনের প্রয়োজনীয় অ্যাপলি', 'cs': 'Zatímco GPT se stala de-facto metodou pro úlohy generování textu, jeho aplikace na metodu pinyin vstupu zůstává neprobádaná.', 'ca': "Mentre que el GPT s'ha convertit en el mèto de de facto per a les tasques de generació de textos, la seva aplicació per a identificar el mètode d'entrada encara no ha estat explorada.", 'bs': 'Iako je GPT postao de-facto metod zadataka za generaciju teksta, njena aplikacija za metod ulaska pinina ostaje neobjašnjena.', 'et': 'Kuigi GPT on muutunud de-facto meetodiks teksti genereerimise ülesannete jaoks, on selle rakendamine pinyini sisendmeetodile jäänud uurimata.', 'fi': 'Vaikka GPT:st채 on tullut de facto menetelm채 tekstintuotantoteht채viss채, sen soveltamista pinyin-sy철tt철menetelm채채n on edelleen tutkimatta.', 'jv': 'checkbox', 'sk': 'Medtem ko je GPT postala de-facto metoda za opravila ustvarjanja besedila, njegova uporaba za metodo vnosa pinyin ostaja neraziskana.', 'ha': "Waka da GPT ya kasance metode de-facto wa aikin mai kizatar matsayi, shirinsa da za'a yi danna cikin metoden inputi ba'a yi buƙata ba.", 'bo': 'GPT ཡིས་ཡིག་གེ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་དངོས་ཡིག་གེ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་འདིའི་ནང་འཇུག', 'he': 'בעוד GPT הפך לשיטה de-facto עבור משימות יוצר טקסט, היישום שלה לפיניין שיטת הכניסה נשאר בלתי חוקר.'}
{'en': 'Situated Dialogue Learning through Procedural Environment Generation', 'ar': 'تعزيز الاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي عبر اللغات عن طريق التعلم الفوري من القوالب متعددة اللغات', 'es': 'Mejora de la inferencia del lenguaje natural multilingüe mediante el aprendizaje rápido a partir de plantillas multilingües', 'pt': 'Aprimorando a inferência de linguagem natural multilíngue por meio do aprendizado imediato a partir de modelos multilíngues', 'fr': "Amélioration de l'inférence multilingue en langage naturel grâce à l'apprentissage rapide à partir de modèles multilingues", 'ja': 'クロスリンガルテンプレートからのプロンプト学習によるクロスリンガル自然言語推論の強化', 'zh': '因从跨语模板示学以增跨语言自然语言理', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी टेम्पलेट्स से प्रॉम्प्ट-लर्निंग द्वारा क्रॉस-भाषी प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान को बढ़ाना', 'ru': 'Улучшение межъязыкового вывода естественного языка путем быстрого обучения на основе межъязыковых шаблонов', 'ga': 'Tátal Teanga Nádúrtha Trastheangach a Fheabhsú trí Phas-fhoghlaim ó Theimpléid Trasteangacha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση της διαγλωσσικής φυσικής γλώσσας με άμεση εκμάθηση από διαγώνια πρότυπα', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű természetes nyelvi fertőzés javítása a többnyelvű sablonokból való gyors tanulással', 'it': "Migliorare l'inferenza linguistica naturale attraverso l'apprendimento rapido da modelli multilingui", 'kk': 'Тілді үлгілерден сұрау оқыту үлгілерін көшеп тілді табиғи тілдерінің қасиеттерін шешу', 'lt': 'Enhancing Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference by Prompt-learning from Cross-lingual Templates', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്കുള്ള മാന്പുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്കുള്ള ഭാഷ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ ക്രോസ', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэл хэлний байгалийн хэл нөлөөлөлт нэмэгдүүлэх нь олон хэл хэлбэрээс суралцах', 'no': 'Forstørrar krysspråk naturleg språk ved å forstørra frå krysspråk- mal', 'mk': 'Појачување на меѓујазичната природна инференција на јазикот со брзо учење од меѓујазичните шаблони', 'ms': 'Meningkatkan Inferensi Bahasa Alami Selata-Bahasa dengan Meminta-belajar dari Templat Selata-Bahasa', 'mt': 'Enhancing Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference by Prompt-learning from Cross-lingual Templates', 'pl': 'Wzmocnienie wniosków języka naturalnego między językami naturalnymi poprzez szybkie uczenie się z wielojęzycznych szablonów', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea inferenței limbajului natural interlingv prin învățarea promptă din șabloane interlingve', 'sr': 'Povećavajući krstojezički prirodni jezik pored promatranja učenja iz krstojezičkih šablona', 'so': 'Horumarinta iskuulka afka asalka ah ee iskuullada iskuulka ah', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Förbättra korspråkig naturlig språkinferens genom snabb inlärning från korspråkiga mallar', 'ta': 'க்ராஸ்- மொழி மொழி இயல்பான மொழி புதுப்பித்தலை மேம்படுத்து', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference کو کروس-زبان ٹمپلٹ سے پورٹ سکونت کے ذریعے زیادہ زیادہ کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường liên lạc ngôn ngữ tự do', 'bg': 'Подобряване на междуезичните естествени езикови изводи чрез бързо обучение от междуезични шаблони', 'hr': 'Povećavajući krstojezički prirodni jezik pored promatranja učenja iz krstojezičkih šablona', 'nl': 'Verbetering van cross-lingual Natural Language Inference door snel leren van cross-lingual templates', 'da': 'Forbedring af tværsproget naturligt sprog inference ved hurtig læring fra tværsprogede skabeloner', 'de': 'Verbesserung der sprachübergreifenden natürlichen Sprachfolge durch schnelles Lernen aus sprachübergreifenden Vorlagen', 'id': 'Enhancing Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference by Prompt-learning from Cross-lingual Templates', 'ko': '크로스 언어 템플릿을 통해 크로스 언어의 자연 언어 추리를 신속하게 학습하고 강화하다', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Kuzuia lugha ya asili ya lugha ya Kiasili na Kujifunza kwa Tamko la kujifunza kutoka kwenye vituo vya lugha-lugha', 'fa': 'افزایش تفاوت زبان طبیعی از طریق یادگیری از قالبهای متوسط زبان', 'af': 'Verbeter Krysspraak Natuurlike Taal Inferensie deur Prompt- leer van Krysspraak Sjabloane', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i kufirit të gjuhës natyrore ndërgjuhësore me nxitjen e mësimit nga modelet ndërgjuhësore', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Խաղալեզվի բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսիայի բարելավումը խրախուսելով լեզվի միջև սովորելը', 'az': '칂ift dill톛rind톛n 칬yr톛nm톛k 칬yr톛nm톛k vasit톛sil톛 칞ox dilli t톛bi톛tli dil f톛rqliyini art캼rmaq', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিরোধের মাধ্যমে ক্রস-ভাষা বৃদ্ধি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Povećavajući krstojezički prirodni jezik pored promatranja učenja iz krstojezičkih šablona', 'ca': 'millorar la influència de llengües naturals translingües aprenent ràpidament a partir de models translingües', 'cs': 'Posílení inference přírodního jazyka mezi jazyky pomocí rychlého učení z vícejazyčných šablon', 'et': 'Keeleülese loodusliku keele järelduse parandamine keeleüleste mallide abil', 'fi': 'Kieltenvälisen luonnollisen kielen inferenssin tehostaminen pikaisesti oppimalla monikielisistä malleista', 'tr': 'Çapraz Dili Daýry Dili Çaplanjak', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'Enhancing Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference by Prompt-learning from Cross-lingual Templates', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje medjezičnega naravnega jezika s hitrim učenjem iz medjezičnih predlog', 'ha': 'Enhancing Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference by Prompt-learning from Cross-lingual Templates', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference by Prompt-learning from Cross-lingual Templates'}
{'en': 'We teach goal driven agents to interactively act and speak in situated environments by training on generated curriculums Our agents operate in LIGHT Urbanek et al 2019)---a large scale crowd sourced fantasy text adventure game wherein an agent perceives and interacts with the world through textual natural language Goals in this environment take the form of character based quests consisting of personas and motivations We augment LIGHT by learning to procedurally generate additional novel textual worlds and quests to create a curriculum of steadily increasing difficulty for training agents to achieve such goals In particular we measure curriculum difficulty in terms of the rarity of the quest in the original training distribution --- an easier environment is one that is more likely to have been found in the unaugmented dataset An ablation study shows that this method of learning from the tail of a distribution results in significantly higher generalization abilities as measured by zero shot performance on never before seen quests', 'ar': 'يعد الاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي عبر اللغات (XNLI) مهمة أساسية في فهم اللغة الطبيعية عبر اللغات. في الآونة الأخيرة ، تتم معالجة هذه المهمة بشكل شائع من خلال نماذج لغوية متعددة اللغات مدربة مسبقًا. تعمل الأساليب الحالية عادةً على تحسين نماذج اللغة المُدرَّبة مسبقًا ببيانات إضافية ، مثل المجموعات التوضيحية المشروحة. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذه البيانات الإضافية نادرة في الممارسة ، خاصة بالنسبة للغات منخفضة الموارد. مستوحاة من النتائج الواعدة الحديثة التي حققها التعلم الفوري ، تقترح هذه الورقة إطارًا جديدًا قائمًا على التعلم الفوري لتعزيز XNLI. يعيد صياغة مشكلة XNLI إلى مشكلة نمذجة لغة مقنعة من خلال إنشاء أسئلة بأسلوب cloze من خلال قوالب متعددة اللغات. لفرض المراسلات بين اللغات المختلفة ، يزيد إطار العمل سؤالًا جديدًا لكل سؤال باستخدام نموذج عينة بلغة أخرى ثم يقدم فقدان تناسق لجعل توزيع احتمالية الإجابة الذي تم الحصول عليه من السؤال الجديد مشابهًا قدر الإمكان مع التوزيع المقابل الذي تم الحصول عليه من السؤال الأصلي. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعتي بيانات معياريتين أن نماذج XNLI المُحسَّنة بواسطة إطار العمل المقترح الخاص بنا تتفوق بشكل كبير على النماذج الأصلية في كل من إعدادات النقل متعدد اللغات واللقطات الكاملة واللقطات القليلة.', 'pt': 'A inferência de linguagem natural entre idiomas (XNLI) é uma tarefa fundamental na compreensão da linguagem natural entre idiomas. Recentemente, essa tarefa é comumente abordada por modelos de linguagem multilíngue pré-treinados. Os métodos existentes geralmente aprimoram os modelos de linguagem pré-treinados com dados adicionais, como corpora paralelos anotados. Esses dados adicionais, no entanto, são raros na prática, especialmente para linguagens de poucos recursos. Inspirado por resultados promissores recentes alcançados pelo aprendizado rápido, este artigo propõe uma nova estrutura baseada no aprendizado rápido para aprimorar o XNLI. Ele reformula o problema XNLI para um problema de modelagem de linguagem mascarada, construindo perguntas no estilo cloze por meio de modelos multilíngues. Para reforçar a correspondência entre diferentes idiomas, a estrutura aumenta uma nova pergunta para cada pergunta usando um modelo de amostra em outro idioma e, em seguida, introduz uma perda de consistência para tornar a distribuição de probabilidade de resposta obtida da nova pergunta o mais semelhante possível com a distribuição correspondente obtida de a pergunta originária. Resultados experimentais em dois conjuntos de dados de referência demonstram que os modelos XNLI aprimorados por nossa estrutura proposta superam significativamente os originais nas configurações de transferência multilíngue full-shot e little-shot.', 'fr': "L'inférence multilingue du langage naturel (XNLI) est une tâche fondamentale dans la compréhension multilingue du langage naturel. Récemment, cette tâche est couramment abordée par des modèles linguistiques interlinguistiques pré-formés. Les méthodes existantes améliorent généralement les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés avec des données supplémentaires, telles que des corpus parallèles annotés. Ces données supplémentaires sont toutefois rares dans la pratique, en particulier pour les langues à faibles ressources. Inspiré par les récents résultats prometteurs obtenus grâce à l'apprentissage rapide, cet article propose un nouveau cadre basé sur l'apprentissage rapide pour améliorer XNLI. Il reformule le problème XNLI en un problème de modélisation linguistique masquée en construisant des questions de style rapproché à l'aide de modèles multilingues. Pour appliquer la correspondance entre les différentes langues, le cadre augmente une nouvelle question pour chaque question à l'aide d'un modèle échantillonné dans une autre langue, puis introduit une perte de cohérence afin de rendre la distribution de probabilité de réponse obtenue à partir de la nouvelle question aussi similaire que possible à la distribution correspondante obtenue à partir de la question initiale. Les résultats expérimentaux sur deux ensembles de données de référence démontrent que les modèles XNLI améliorés par notre cadre proposé surpassent de manière significative les modèles originaux dans les paramètres de transfert multilingue en plan complet et en petit plan.", 'es': 'La inferencia del lenguaje natural multilingüe (XNLI) es una tarea fundamental en la comprensión del lenguaje natural multilingüe. Recientemente, esta tarea se aborda comúnmente mediante modelos lingüísticos multilingües previamente entrenados. Los métodos existentes suelen mejorar los modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados con datos adicionales, como cuerpos paralelos anotados. Sin embargo, estos datos adicionales son poco frecuentes en la práctica, especialmente para los idiomas de bajos recursos. Inspirado en los prometedores resultados recientes logrados por el aprendizaje rápido, este artículo propone un marco novedoso basado en el aprendizaje rápido para mejorar la XNLI. Reformula el problema XNLI a un problema de modelado de lenguaje enmascarado mediante la construcción de preguntas de estilo cloze a través de plantillas multilingües. Para hacer cumplir la correspondencia entre los diferentes idiomas, el marco aumenta una nueva pregunta para cada pregunta utilizando una plantilla de muestra en otro idioma y, a continuación, introduce una pérdida de coherencia para hacer que la distribución de probabilidad de respuesta obtenida de la nueva pregunta sea lo más similar posible con el distribución correspondiente obtenida de la pregunta original. Los resultados experimentales en dos conjuntos de datos de referencia demuestran que los modelos XNLI mejorados por nuestro marco propuesto superan significativamente a los originales tanto en la configuración de transferencia multilingüe completa como de pocas tomas.', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान (XNLI) क्रॉस-लिंगुअल प्राकृतिक भाषा की समझ में एक मौलिक कार्य है। हाल ही में इस कार्य को आमतौर पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित क्रॉस-लिंगुअल भाषा मॉडल द्वारा संबोधित किया जाता है। मौजूदा तरीके आमतौर पर अतिरिक्त डेटा के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को बढ़ाते हैं, जैसे कि एनोटेटेड समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट। हालांकि, ये अतिरिक्त डेटा व्यवहार में दुर्लभ हैं, विशेष रूप से कम संसाधन वाली भाषाओं के लिए। प्रॉम्प्ट-लर्निंग द्वारा प्राप्त हाल के आशाजनक परिणामों से प्रेरित होकर, यह पेपर XNLI को बढ़ाने के लिए एक उपन्यास प्रॉम्प्ट-लर्निंग आधारित ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करता है। यह क्रॉस-लिंगुअल टेम्पलेट्स के माध्यम से क्लोज़-शैली के प्रश्नों का निर्माण करके एक नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडलिंग समस्या के लिए XNLI समस्या को फिर से तैयार करता है। विभिन्न भाषाओं के बीच पत्राचार को लागू करने के लिए, फ्रेमवर्क किसी अन्य भाषा में नमूना टेम्पलेट का उपयोग करके प्रत्येक प्रश्न के लिए एक नया प्रश्न बढ़ाता है और फिर मूल प्रश्न से प्राप्त संबंधित वितरण के साथ यथासंभव समान नए प्रश्न से प्राप्त उत्तर संभाव्यता वितरण को बनाने के लिए एक स्थिरता हानि का परिचय देता है। दो बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारे प्रस्तावित ढांचे द्वारा बढ़ाया गया एक्सएनएलआई मॉडल पूर्ण-शॉट और कुछ-शॉट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर सेटिंग्स दोनों के तहत मूल लोगों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाते हैं।', 'zh': '语言自然语言理 (XNLI) 跨言自然语言解之一务也。 近者,此务常以预练之语。 今有法常用他数(如带注并行语料库)以增豫训之语。 然此数在实践中罕见,尤于低资源语。 受近以速学之望,本文立一基于新型框架以增XNLI。 因跨语模板造 cloze 式,更表 XNLI 为蔽言建模。 强言语之应,框架用一言采样模板各增一新,然后引入一致性损,以使得对概率分布与原始问题得者相似。 两准数集之实验结果表明,于全镜头与少镜头跨语移置,吾等言框架增强者XNLI形见优于始。', 'ru': 'Межъязыковой вывод естественного языка (XNLI) является фундаментальной задачей в понимании межъязыкового естественного языка. В последнее время эта задача обычно решается с помощью предварительно подготовленных моделей межязыкового общения. Существующие методы обычно улучшают предварительно обученные языковые модели с дополнительными данными, такими как аннотированные параллельные тела. Однако эти дополнительные данные на практике встречаются редко, особенно для языков с ограниченными ресурсами. В этом документе, вдохновленном недавними многообещающими результатами, достигнутыми с помощью быстрого обучения, предлагается новаторская структура, основанная на быстром обучении, для улучшения XNLI. Он переформулирует задачу XNLI в проблему моделирования языка в маскировке, создавая вопросы в стиле Cloze с помощью межъязыковых шаблонов. Чтобы обеспечить соответствие между различными языками, структура дополняет новый вопрос для каждого вопроса, используя выбранный шаблон на другом языке, а затем вводит потерю согласованности, чтобы распределение вероятности ответа, полученное из нового вопроса, было как можно более схожим с соответствующим распределением, полученным из первоначального вопроса. Экспериментальные результаты на двух эталонных наборах данных показывают, что модели XNLI, усовершенствованные нашей предлагаемой системой, значительно превосходят оригинальные модели при настройках межязычной передачи как с полной, так и с малой частотой.', 'ja': 'クロスリンガル自然言語推論（ XNLI ）は、クロスリンガル自然言語理解における基本的な課題である。 最近では、このタスクは事前に訓練されたクロスリンガル言語モデルによって一般的に対処されています。 既存の方法は、通常、注釈付き並列コーパスなどの追加データを使用して、事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルを強化します。 しかしながら、これらの追加データは、特に低資源言語の場合、実際には稀である。 この論文は、プロンプト学習によって達成された最近の有望な結果に触発されて、XNLIを強化するための新しいプロンプト学習ベースのフレームワークを提案している。 クロスリンガルテンプレートを通じてクローズスタイルの質問を構築することにより、XNLI問題をマスクされた言語モデリング問題に再構築します。 異なる言語間の対応を強制するために、フレームワークは、別の言語のサンプリングされたテンプレートを使用して、すべての質問に対して新しい質問を拡張し、次いで、一貫性の損失を導入して、新しい質問から得られた回答確率分布を、元の質問から得られた対応する分布と可能な限り類似させる。 2つのベンチマークデータセットの実験結果は、提案されたフレームワークによって強化されたXNLIモデルが、フルショットおよび数ショットのクロスリンガル転送設定の両方で、元のモデルを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。', 'ga': 'Tasc bunúsach i dtuiscint teanga nádúrtha thrastheangach is ea tátal nádúrtha teanga nádúrtha (XNLI). Le déanaí tugtar aghaidh go coitianta ar an tasc seo trí mhúnlaí teanga tras-teanga réamh-oilte. De ghnáth cuireann modhanna atá ann cheana féin le samhlacha teanga réamhoilte le sonraí breise, mar chorpora comhthreomhar anótáilte. Is annamh a bhíonn na sonraí breise seo, áfach, go háirithe i gcás teangacha íseal-acmhainne. Arna spreagadh ag torthaí geallta le déanaí a baineadh amach trí phrasfhoghlaim, molann an páipéar seo creat nuálaíoch pras-fhoghlaim-bhunaithe chun XNLI a fheabhsú. Déanann sé an fhadhb XNLI a athfhoirmliú go fadhb samhaltaithe teanga faoi cheilt trí cheisteanna ar an stíl shamhailteach a chur le chéile trí theimpléid thrasteangacha. Chun comhfhreagras idir teangacha éagsúla a chur i bhfeidhm, cuireann an creat le ceist nua do gach ceist ag baint úsáide as teimpléad samplach i dteanga eile agus ansin tugtar isteach caillteanas comhsheasmhachta le go mbeidh dáileadh dóchúlachta na bhfreagraí a fhaightear ón gceist nua chomh comhchosúil agus is féidir leis an dáileadh comhfhreagrach a fhaightear ó an bhuncheist. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá thacar sonraí tagarmhairc go sáraíonn samhlacha XNLI arna bhfeabhsú ag ár gcreat molta na cinn bhunaidh faoi na socruithe aistrithe tras-teanga lán-shot agus lámhaigh araon.', 'ka': 'კრასი ენგუფიკალური ნაირადი ენგუფიკაცია (XNLI) არის ფუნდამენტური დავალება კრასი ენგუფიკალური ენგუფიკალური განსხვავებაში. მიმდინარე ეს დავალება უბრალოდ დასაწყებული მრავალური ენების მოდელებით დააწყება. Existing methods usually enhance pre-trained language models with additional data, such as annotated parallel corpora. მაგრამ ეს დამატებული მონაცემები პრაქტიკულად არიან, განსაკუთრებით ჩამო რესურსის ენებისთვის. ახალგაზრდებული მომეხსოვრებული შედეგი, რომელიც წინასწარმატებით სწავლებით მიიღებულია, ეს კონფიგურაცია ახალგაზრდება კონფიგურაციას, რომელიც XNLI-ს გაუფ ეს XNLI პრობლემას მაქსირებული ენის მოდელირების პრობლემაზე რეფორმეტულებს, კლოზის სტილის კითხვების შექმნა მრავალური შაბლონებით. განსხვავებული ენების შორის კოსპორესტენტის შესაძლებლობისთვის, ფრამეტრი ახალი კითხვა ახალი კითხვაზე ახალი კითხვაზე, რომელიც სხვა ენაში გამოყენებული შაბლონის გამოყენება და შემდეგ შესაძლებელობის დაკავშირება, რომ განსხვავებ ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემების ორი ბანქმენტიური მონაცემების შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ XNLI მოდელები ჩვენი წარმოდგინული პარამეტრებით უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომლებიც უფრო მნიშვნ', 'el': 'Το συμπέρασμα της διασυνοριακής φυσικής γλώσσας (XNLI) αποτελεί θεμελιώδες έργο στην κατανόηση της διασυνοριακής φυσικής γλώσσας. Πρόσφατα, το έργο αυτό αντιμετωπίζεται συνήθως από προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι συνήθως ενισχύουν τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα με πρόσθετα δεδομένα, όπως σχολιασμένα παράλληλα σώματα. Αυτά τα πρόσθετα δεδομένα, ωστόσο, είναι σπάνια στην πράξη, ειδικά για γλώσσες χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε πόρους. Εμπνευσμένη από τα πρόσφατα υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν με τη γρήγορη μάθηση, η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ένα νέο πλαίσιο άμεσης μάθησης που βασίζεται στην ενίσχυση του XNLI. Επαναδιατυπώνει το πρόβλημα σε ένα πρόβλημα μοντελοποίησης μασκαρισμένης γλώσσας με την κατασκευή ερωτήσεων τύπου cloze μέσω διαγώνινων προτύπων. Για να επιβάλει την αντιστοιχία μεταξύ διαφορετικών γλωσσών, το πλαίσιο προσθέτει μια νέα ερώτηση για κάθε ερώτηση χρησιμοποιώντας ένα δειγματοληπτικό πρότυπο σε άλλη γλώσσα και στη συνέχεια εισάγει μια απώλεια συνοχής για να καταστήσει την κατανομή πιθανότητας απάντησης που λαμβάνεται από τη νέα ερώτηση όσο το δυνατόν πιο παρόμοια με την αντίστοιχη κατανομή που λαμβάνεται από την αρχική ερώτηση. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων αναφοράς καταδεικνύουν ότι τα μοντέλα XNLI που ενισχύονται από το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο μας ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τα πρωτότυπα, τόσο στις ρυθμίσεις πλήρους όσο και στις ρυθμίσεις μερικής γλωσσικής μεταφοράς.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű természetes nyelvű következtetés (XNLI) alapvető feladat a többnyelvű természetes nyelvű megértésben. A közelmúltban ezt a feladatot általában előre képzett, többnyelvű nyelvű modellek kezelik. A meglévő módszerek általában további adatokkal, például jegyzetelt párhuzamos korpuszokkal javítják az előre képzett nyelvi modelleket. Ezek a kiegészítő adatok azonban ritkák a gyakorlatban, különösen az alacsony erőforrású nyelvek esetében. A prompt-learning által elért ígéretes eredmények inspirálták a tanulmány egy új prompt-learning alapú keretrendszert javasol az XNLI fejlesztésére. Az XNLI problémát maszkos nyelvmodellezési problémává alakítja át azáltal, hogy többnyelvű sablonok segítségével álcázott stílusú kérdéseket épít fel. A különböző nyelvek közötti megfelelés érvényesítése érdekében a keretrendszer minden kérdésre egy másik nyelvű mintavételes sablon segítségével kiegészít egy új kérdést, majd következetességi veszteséget vezet be annak érdekében, hogy az új kérdésből kapott válasz valószínűségi eloszlás a lehető leghasonlóbb legyen az eredeti kérdésből kapott megfelelő eloszlással. Két benchmark adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt keretrendszer által továbbfejlesztett XNLI modellek jelentősen felülmúlják az eredetieket mind a teljes, mind a néhány felvételű keresztnyelvű transzfer beállítások mellett.', 'kk': 'Тілі тілдердің көптеген тәуелсіздік тілдерінің (XNLI) түсініктерінің негізгі тапсырмасы. Жуырда бұл тапсырма көбінесе алдын- ақпаратты тіл үлгілерінде адрестіледі. Бар әдістер кәдімгі алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілерін қосымша деректермен көтереді, мысалы, параллель корпора секілді. Бұл қосымша мәліметтер әрекетінде тәжірибе, әсіресе төмен ресурс тілдері үшін. Бұл қағаз XNLI жақсарту үшін жаңа жұмыс істеу нәтижелері арқылы жасалған. Бұл қағаз XNLI- ді жақсарту үшін жаңа жұмыс оқыту негіздеген жағдайын көрсетеді. Бұл XNLI мәселесін бірнеше тіл үлгілері арқылы клос стилінің сұрақтарын құру үшін қалқан тілдерді моделдеу мәселесіне өзгертеді. Басқа тілдер арасындағы сұрақтарды орындау үшін, басқа тілде үлгі үлгісін қолданатын әрбір сұрақтардың жаңа сұрақтарын көтеріп, содан кейін жауапты маңызды сұрақтардан жаңа сұрақтардың маңызды үлестірімін басқа сұр Екі бағдарламалық деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері XNLI үлгілерін қолданылатын қоршаудағы қолданылатын қорларымыздың бастапқы бағдарламаларды толық және бірнеше тілді аудару параметрл', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbinė natūrali kalbų išvada (XNLI) yra pagrindinė užduotis tarpkalbinio natūralaus kalbų supratimo srityje. Pastaruoju metu šią užduotį dažnai sprendžia iš anksto parengti tarpkalbiniai modeliai. Esami metodai paprastai tobulina iš anksto parengtus kalbų modelius su papildomais duomenimis, pavyzdžiui, anotuotu lygiagrečiu korporu. Tačiau šie papildomi duomenys praktiškai yra reti, ypač mažai išteklių turinčioms kalboms. Įkvėptas naujausiais pažadusiais rezultatais, pasiektais greito mokymosi būdu, šiame dokumente siūloma nauja greito mokymosi sistema XNLI stiprinimui. Ji persvarsto XNLI problem ą į paslėptą kalbų modeliavimo problemą, sukuriant klozo stilius užduodamus klausimus naudojant tarpkalbinius šablonus. Siekiant užtikrinti skirtingų kalbų korespondenciją, sistema papildo naują kiekvieno klausimo klausimą, naudojant atrinktą šabloną kita kalba, o vėliau nustatomas nuoseklumo praradimas, kad iš naujo klausimo gautas atsakymo tikimybės pasiskirstymas būtų kuo panašus į atitinkamą pasiskirstymą, gautą iš pradinio klausimo. Dviejų lyginamųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad XNLI modeliai, patobulinti pagal mūsų siūlomą sistemą, gerokai viršija pradinius modelius tiek visiško, tiek kelių nuotraukų tarpkalbinio perdavimo sąlygomis.', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്-ഭാഷ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ അപരിഹാരം (എക്സ്\u200cനിലി) ക്രിസ്ലാവിലെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതില്\u200d  Recently this task is commonly addressed by pre-trained cross-lingual language models.  നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സാധാരണ പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ക എന്നാലും ഈ കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വളരെ കുറഞ്ഞതാണ്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് കുറഞ്ഞത് വ പെട്ടെന്ന് പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രതിജ്ഞാനമുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പേപ്പറിന് എക്സ്എന്\u200dഎലി ക്ലോസ്- ശൈലി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ക്രോസ്-ലിങ്ങ് മാന്\u200dപ്പുകളിലൂടെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d എക്സ്\u200cനിലിയുടെ പ്രശ്നം മുഖ് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, ഒരു മാമ്പ്ളേള്\u200dഡ് മാല്\u200dപ്ലേറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഓരോ ചോദ്യത്തിനും ഒരു പുതിയ ചോദ്യം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന് രണ്ട് ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫ്രെയിമോഡല്\u200d മൊഡലുകള്\u200d', 'it': "L'inferenza cross-lingual natural language (XNLI) è un compito fondamentale nella comprensione cross-lingual natural language. Recentemente questo compito è comunemente affrontato da modelli linguistici multilingui pre-formati. I metodi esistenti di solito migliorano i modelli linguistici pre-addestrati con dati aggiuntivi, come i corpi paralleli annotati. Questi dati aggiuntivi, tuttavia, sono rari nella pratica, soprattutto per i linguaggi a basso contenuto di risorse. Ispirato ai recenti promettenti risultati raggiunti dal prompt-learning, questo articolo propone un nuovo framework basato sull'apprendimento rapido per migliorare XNLI. Riformula il problema XNLI in un problema di modellazione del linguaggio mascherato costruendo domande in stile cloze attraverso modelli cross-lingual. Per far rispettare la corrispondenza tra lingue diverse, il framework aumenta una nuova domanda per ogni domanda utilizzando un modello campione in un'altra lingua e quindi introduce una perdita di coerenza per rendere la distribuzione di probabilità di risposta ottenuta dalla nuova domanda il più simile possibile con la distribuzione corrispondente ottenuta dalla domanda originale. I risultati sperimentali su due set di dati di benchmark dimostrano che i modelli XNLI migliorati dal framework proposto superano significativamente quelli originali sia con le impostazioni di trasferimento cross-lingual full-shot che con pochi scatti.", 'mk': 'Кросјазичната природна инференција на јазикот (XNLI) е фундаментална задача во кросјазичното разбирање на природниот јазик. Recently this task is commonly addressed by pre-trained cross-lingual language models.  Постојаните методи обично ги подобруваат предобучените јазички модели со дополнителни податоци, како што се анотираните паралелни корпора. Сепак, овие дополнителни податоци се ретки во практиката, особено за јазиците со ниски ресурси. Инспириран од неодамнешните ветувачки резултати постигнати со брзо учење, овој документ предлага нова рамка базирана на брзо учење за подобрување на XNLI. Истиот го реформира XNLI-проблемот на маскиран проблем со моделирање на јазици со конструкција на прашања во стил на клоз преку меѓујазични шаблони. За да се спроведе кореспонденцијата помеѓу различните јазици, рамката го зголемува новото прашање за секое прашање користејќи примерок на шаблон на друг јазик и потоа воведува загуба на константност за да се направи дистрибуцијата на веројатноста на одговорот добиена од новото прашање што е можно подеднаква со соодветната дистр Експерименталните резултати на двата бази на податоци покажуваат дека XNLI моделите подобрени од нашата предложена рамка значително ги надминуваат оригиналните под целосните и неколку бази поставувања за крстојазичен трансфер.', 'no': 'Krysspråk naturspråk-infeksjon (XNLI) er ein grunnleggjande oppgåve i krysspråk naturspråk-forståelse. Nyleg er denne oppgåva vanlegvis adressert av fleirspråk- modeller før- trenga. Etter eksisterande metodar vil vanlegvis forbetra før- trengte språk- modeller med ekstra data, som merka parallelle korpora. Desse ekstra data er imidlertid sjeldre i praksis, spesielt for låg ressursspråk. Dette papiret foreslår eit nyleg prompt-læring basert rammeverk for å forbedra XNLI. Det reformerer XNLI- problemet til eit maskert språk- modellering ved å konstruere klosestilspørsmål gjennom krysspråk- mal. For å køyra korrespondensjon mellom ulike språk, vil rammeverket auka eit nytt spørsmål for kvar spørsmål ved å bruka eit utvalte mal i eit anna språk, og så introdusera ein mislukk av konsistensitet for å gjera at sannsynlighetsferdelingen får frå den nye spørsmålet så liknande som mogleg med den tilsvarande distribusjonen får Eksperimentale resultat på to benchmarkdatasett viser at XNLI-modeller forbetra av vårt foreslått rammeverket utfører signifikante opprinnelige under både innstillingane for fullstendig og få-shot krysspråk.', 'mt': 'L-inferenza tal-lingwi naturali translingwi (XNLI) hija kompitu fundamentali fil-fehim tal-lingwi naturali translingwi. Recently this task is commonly addressed by pre-trained cross-lingual language models.  Il-metodi eżistenti normalment itejbu mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel b’dejta addizzjonali, bħal korpora parallela annotata. These additional data, however, are rare in practice, especially for low-resource languages.  Inspirat mir-riżultati promettenti reċenti miksuba bit-tagħlim fil-pront, dan id-dokument jipproponi qafas ġdid ibbażat fuq it-tagħlim fil-pront għat-titjib tal-XNLI. Hija tirriformula l-problem a XNLI għal problema ta’ mudellar tal-lingwi maskrat billi tibni mistoqsijiet bi stil ta’ kloze permezz ta’ mudelli translingwi. Biex tiġi infurzata l-korrispondenza bejn lingwi differenti, il-qafas iżid mistoqsija ġdida għal kull mistoqsija bl-użu ta’ mudell fil-kampjun f’lingwa oħra u mbagħad jintroduċi telf ta’ konsistenza biex id-distribuzzjoni tal-probabbiltà tat-tweġiba miksuba mill-mistoqsija l-ġdida ssir kemm jista’ jkun simili għad-distribuzzjoni korrispondenti miksuba mill-mistoqsija oriġinali. Riżultati esperimentali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ parametri referenzjarji juru li mudelli XNLI mtejba mill-qafas propost tagħna jaqbżu b’mod sinifikanti dawk oriġinali kemm taħt is-settijiet ta’ trasferiment translingwistiku full-shot kif ukoll bi ftit shot.', 'mn': 'Хөгжлийн байгалийн хэл халдвар (XNLI) нь олон хэлний байгалийн хэл ойлголтын үндсэн ажил юм. Өмнөх үед энэ үйл ажиллагааг олон хэл хэл загвараар дүрслэгддэг. Ингээд байгаа арга баримтууд илүү сургалтын хэл загваруудыг нэмэлт мэдээллээр нэмэгдүүлдэг. Гэхдээ эдгээр нэмэлт мэдээллүүд дасгал хөдөлгөөнд ховор байдаг, ялангуяа бага нөөцийн хэл дээр. Сүүлийн үеийн амлалтын үр дүнд хүрэхдээ энэ цаас XNLI-г нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд шинэ хурдан суралцах сургалтыг санал болгодог. Энэ нь XNLI асуудлыг хэл загварын асуудлыг олон хэл загварын аргаар шинэчлүүлдэг. Өөр хэл хоорондын харилцааны тухай хүлээн зөвшөөрөхийн тулд асуулт бүрт шинэ асуулт нэмэгдүүлнэ. Дараа нь өөр хэл дээр шалгалтыг ашиглаж, хариултын магадлалын хуваалтыг шинэ асуултаас гаргах магадлалын хуваалтыг эхний асуултаас гаргасан хар Хоёр давхар өгөгдлийн сан дээрх туршилтын үр дүн нь XNLI загварыг бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн хэлбэрээр нэмэгдүүлсэн үндсэн зүйлсийг бүрэн зураг болон хэдэн хэлний давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар давхар дав', 'pl': 'Interlingualne wnioskowanie języka naturalnego (XNLI) jest podstawowym zadaniem w rozumieniu języka naturalnego między językami naturalnymi. Ostatnio zadanie to jest powszechnie rozwiązywane przez wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe wielojęzyczne. Istniejące metody zwykle uzupełniają wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe o dodatkowe dane, takie jak adnotacje równoległych korpusów. Te dodatkowe dane są jednak rzadkie w praktyce, zwłaszcza w przypadku języków o niskich zasobach. Zainspirowany ostatnimi obiecującymi rezultatami osiągniętymi dzięki szybkiemu uczeniu się, niniejszy artykuł proponuje nowe ramy oparte na szybkim uczeniu się, służące poprawie XNLI. Przeformułuje problem XNLI na zamaskowany problem modelowania języka poprzez konstruowanie pytań w stylu cloze za pomocą szablonów wielojęzycznych. Aby wymuszyć korespondencję między różnymi językami, ramy rozszerzają nowe pytanie dla każdego pytania za pomocą próbkowanego szablonu w innym języku, a następnie wprowadzają utratę spójności, aby rozkład prawdopodobieństwa odpowiedzi uzyskany z nowego pytania był jak najbardziej zbliżony do odpowiedniego rozkładu uzyskanego z pierwotnego pytania. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch zestawach danych referencyjnych pokazują, że modele XNLI ulepszone przez nasze proponowane ramy znacznie przewyższają oryginalne w ustawieniach transferu pełnego i kilku ujęzyków.', 'ro': 'Inferența limbajului natural translingvistic (XNLI) este o sarcină fundamentală în înțelegerea limbajului natural translingvistic. Recent, această sarcină este abordată de obicei de modele lingvistice translingvistice pre-instruite. Metodele existente îmbunătățesc, de obicei, modelele lingvistice pre-instruite cu date suplimentare, cum ar fi corpore paralele adnotate. Cu toate acestea, aceste date suplimentare sunt rare în practică, în special pentru limbile cu resurse reduse. Inspirată de rezultatele promițătoare recente obținute prin prompt-learning, această lucrare propune un nou cadru bazat pe prompt-learning pentru îmbunătățirea XNLI. Reformulează problema XNLI la o problemă mascată de modelare a limbajului prin construirea întrebărilor în stil cloze prin intermediul șabloanelor cross-lingvistice. Pentru a impune corespondența între diferite limbi, cadrul extinde o nouă întrebare pentru fiecare întrebare folosind un șablon eșantionat într-o altă limbă și introduce apoi o pierdere de consistență pentru a face distribuția probabilității de răspuns obținută din noua întrebare cât mai similară posibil cu distribuția corespunzătoare obținută din întrebarea inițială. Rezultatele experimentale asupra a două seturi de date de referință demonstrează că modelele XNLI îmbunătățite de cadrul nostru propus depășesc semnificativ cele originale atât în setările de transfer translingvistic complete, cât și în setările de transfer translingvistic cu câteva fotografii.', 'sr': 'Krozjezička prirodna jezika infekcija (XNLI) je fundamentalni zadatak u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Nedavno se ovaj zadatak često obrađuje predobučeni međujezički modeli. Postoje metode obično povećavaju predobučene jezičke modele sa dodatnim podacima, kao što su annotirane paralelne korpore. Međutim, ovi dodatni podaci su rijetki u praksi, posebno za jezike niskih resursa. Inspiran nedavnim obećavajućim rezultatima postignutim ubrzano učenjem, ovaj papir predlaže novi okvir na ubrzano učenje baziran na osnovu pojačanja XNLI. To reformiše XNLI problem maskiranom jezikom modeliranjem problem a izgradnjem pitanja iz kloza stila kroz preko jezičkih hramena. Da bi se izvršilo dopisnost između različitih jezika, okvir povećava novo pitanje za svako pitanje koristeći uzorak šablona na drugom jeziku, a zatim uvede gubitak konsekvencije kako bi se distribucija verovatnosti odgovora dobila iz novog pitanja što je moguće sličnije s odgovarajućim distribucijom dobijenom iz originalnog pitanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka o referenciji pokazuju da su modeli XNLI poboljšani od našeg predloženog okvira značajno iznosili originalne pod punim snimanjem i nekoliko metaka preko jezika.', 'so': "Cudurka afka asalka ah (XNLI) waa shuqul aasaasi ah oo ku qoran waxgarashada luuqadaha dabiicadda ah. Muddo u dhowaad shaqadaas waxaa lagu magacaabaa tusaale ahaan afka luuqada kala duwan oo horay loo tababaray. Sida caadiga ah qaababka joogtada waxaa lagu kordhiyaa tusaale ahaan qoraalka afka hore oo la tababaray oo ku qoran macluumaad dheeraad ah, tusaale ahaan shirkadda lambarka ah. These additional data, however, are rare in practice, especially for low-resource languages.  Dhab ahaan waxaa loo soo dhiibay arimaha la ballanqaaday ee loo soo dejiyey barashada degdeg ah, warqaddaas ayaa soo jeedinaya qoraal ku saleysan barashada hore ee kordhiya XNLI. Dhibaatada XNLI waxay u bedeshaa dhibaato ku saabsan qaabka afka maskaxda ah, waxayna ku sameynaysaa su'aalaha cloze-style ee ku qoran qoraalka luuqadaha kala duduwan. Si loo sameeyo isku xiriirka luuqadaha kala duduwan, asalka ayaa su'aal cusub u dalban kara su'aal kasta oo ku isticmaalaya qoraal tusaale ah oo luuqad kale ku qoran, kadibna wuxuu soo saaraa khasaaro joogta ah si ay uga qaybsato jawaabta warqada cusub sida suurtagal ah oo ugu habboon qaybinta su'aalka asalka ah. Imtixaanka labada benchmark databases waxay muujiyaan in dhaqdhaqaalaha XNLI uu ku kordhiyey qoraalkayagii lagu talo galay uu si muhiim ah u sameeyo kooxaha hore ee qoraalka ku qoran iyo kooxaha wareejinta luqada oo dhan.", 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවක් ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් (XNLI) ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවික භාෂාව තේරුම් ගන්න මේ කාර්ය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරධානය කළු භාෂාව භාෂාව මොඩේල් වලින් ලැබෙනවා. ඉතින් තියෙන්නේ විදියට සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂා මොඩේල් එක්ක තවත් තොරතුරු සඳහා වැඩි කර ඒත් මේ තවත් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන්ම අඩු සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවට. අලුත් පොරොන්දු වාර්තාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පුළුවන් වුනා, මේ පැත්තේ XNLI විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර Name වෙනස් භාෂාවල් අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් භාෂාවයේ සැම්පල් කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සඳහා අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්න බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සැට් දෙකට පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ XNLI මොඩේල් අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Cross-lingual natural language inference (XNLI) är en grundläggande uppgift för cross-lingual natural language förståelse. Nyligen har denna uppgift ofta tagits upp av förklädda språkmodeller. Befintliga metoder förbättrar vanligtvis förklädda språkmodeller med ytterligare data, till exempel kommenterade parallella korpora. Dessa ytterligare uppgifter är dock sällsynta i praktiken, särskilt för språk med låg resurs. Inspirerad av senaste tidens lovande resultat som uppnåtts genom prompt-learning, föreslår denna uppsats en ny prompt-learning baserad ram för att förbättra XNLI. Det omformulerar XNLI-problemet till ett maskerat språkmodelleringsproblem genom att konstruera cloze-stil frågor genom flerspråkiga mallar. För att upprätthålla korrespondens mellan olika språk utökar ramverket en ny fråga för varje fråga med hjälp av en provmall på ett annat språk och introducerar sedan en konsekvent förlust för att göra den svarsandsynlighetsfördelning som erhållits från den nya frågan så lik som möjligt med motsvarande fördelning som erhållits från den ursprungliga frågan. Experimentella resultat på två benchmarkdatauppsättningar visar att XNLI-modeller som förbättrats av vårt föreslagna ramverk avsevärt överträffar original under både fullskotts- och enkelskotts-tvärspråkliga överföringsinställningar.', 'ms': 'Keputusan bahasa semulajadi saling bahasa (XNLI) adalah tugas asas dalam pemahaman bahasa semulajadi saling bahasa. Baru-baru ini tugas ini biasanya dihadapkan oleh model bahasa salib-bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih. Existing methods usually enhance pre-trained language models with additional data, such as annotated parallel corpora.  Tetapi data tambahan ini jarang berlaku, terutama untuk bahasa sumber rendah. Diterinspirasi oleh hasil yang berjanji yang baru-baru ini dicapai dengan pembelajaran-cepat, kertas ini melamar kerangka pembelajaran-cepat berbasis novel untuk meningkatkan XNLI. It reformulates the XNLI problem to a masked language modeling problem by constructing cloze-style questions through cross-lingual templates.  To enforce correspondence between different languages, the framework augments a new question for every question using a sampled template in another language and then introduces a consistency loss to make the answer probability distribution obtained from the new question as similar as possible with the corresponding distribution obtained from the original question.  Keputusan percubaan pada dua set data benchmark menunjukkan bahawa model XNLI yang ditambah oleh kerangka kami direncanakan melampaui yang asal secara signifikan di bawah kedua-dua tetapan pemindahan bahasa penuh dan beberapa-shot.', 'ur': 'Cross-language natural language inference (XNLI) is a fundamental task in cross-language natural language understanding. اچھے سے یہ کام معمولاً مختلف زبان کی مدل سے پڑھی جاتی ہے۔ Existing methods usually enhance pre-trained language models with additional data, such as annotated parallel corpora. لیکن یہ اضافہ ڈیٹا اضافہ کی تعبیر میں بہت کم ہیں، مخصوصاً کم منبع زبانوں کے لئے۔ اس کاغذ نے اچھے وعدہ کے نتیجے کے ذریعہ پیدا کئے ہیں جو اچھے وقت کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ پہنچ گئے ہیں، یہ کاغذ XNLI کو بڑھانے کے لئے ایک نئی پیغام کی تعلیم کی بنیادی فرمود کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. اس نے XNLI مسئلہ کو ایک ماسک زبان موڈلینگ مسئلہ کے ذریعہ تغییر دیتا ہے کہ کروس زبان کے ٹیپلٹوں کے ذریعہ کلوز استیل سوال بناتے ہیں. مختلف زبانوں کے درمیان متفاوت کا مطالبہ کرنا، فرمیک ہر سوال کے لئے ایک نئی سوال اضافہ کرتا ہے اور پھر ایک نئی زبان میں نمونڈ ٹیپلٹ کا استعمال کرتا ہے اور پھر ایک نقصان اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ جواب کے احتمالی تقسیم کو نئی سوال سے پہنچا سکتا ہے جیسے ممکن ہے اس کے مطالب تقسیم دو بنچم مارک ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ XNLI موڈل ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا فرمود کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ اضافہ ہونے والی اصلی موجودات دونوں پر پورے-شٹ اور کم-شٹ کرس-زبان ترنسیٹ سٹینٹ', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- மொழி இயல்பான மொழி புரியும் (XNLI) ஒரு முதன்மையான பணி சமீபத்தில் இந்த செயல் முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகளால் பொதுவாக முகவரிக்கப்படுகிறது. தற்போதைய முறைமைகள் வழக்கமாக முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளை கூடுதல் தரவுடன் அதிகரி ஆனால் இந்த கூடுதல் தகவல் செயல்பாட்டில் குறைவானது, குறைந்த மூலத்தின் மொழிகளுக்கு. சமீபத்தில் விரைவாக கற்றுக் கொண்டு சம்பாதிக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளால் வழங்கப்படுகிறது, இந்த த தாள் XNLI மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான புதிய வி இது XNLI பிரச்சனையை முகத்திடப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி உருவாக்கும் பிரச்சனைக்கு மாற்றுகிறது குளோஸ்- பாணியின் கேள்விகள To enforce correspondence between different languages, the framework augments a new question for every question using a sampled template in another language and then introduces a consistency loss to make the answer probability distribution obtained from the new question as similar as possible with the corresponding distribution obtained from the original question.  இரண்டு பெங்குரு தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது எக்ஸ்என்லி மாதிரிகள் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது எக்ஸ்என்லி மாதிரியு', 'uz': 'Name Yaqinda bu vazifa bir necha tildan oldin ishlatilgan foydalanuvchi modellari. Existing methods usually enhance pre-trained language models with additional data, such as annotated parallel corpora.  Lekin, bu qoʻshimcha maʼlumot bajarayotganda juda qisqa, hususan kichkina rasm til uchun. Name Name @ info: whatsthis Name', 'vi': 'Cộng đồng ngôn ngữ tự do xuyên ngôn ngữ (XNLI) là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng trong việc hiểu biết ngôn ngữ tự do xuyên rộng. Gần đây, nhiệm vụ này thường được thực hiện bởi các mẫu ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Sự tồn tại thường làm tăng cường mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo với dữ liệu bổ sung, như ghi chú bằng chữ "B". Những dữ liệu bổ sung này, tuy nhiên, rất hiếm trong thực tế, đặc biệt là ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên. Nguồn cảm hứng từ những kết quả hứa hẹn gần đây được tiến hành bằng việc học nhanh, bài báo đề xuất một cơ sở mới dựa trên ham muốn XNLI. Nó cải tạo vấn đề XNLI thành vấn đề mềm ngôn ngữ đeo mặt nạ bằng cách kiến tạo các câu hỏi kiểu quần quật qua các mẫu ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để đảm bảo sự liên hệ giữa các ngôn ngữ khác nhau, bộ khung đề nghị một câu hỏi mới cho mỗi câu hỏi bằng cách sử dụng mẫu thử tại một ngôn ngữ khác và sau đó tạo ra một sự mất cân bằng để tạo ra mức phân phối xác suất trả lời lấy từ câu hỏi mới có thể giống với phân phối tương ứng từ câu hỏi ban đầu. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên hai tập tin mẫu tiêu chuẩn chứng minh rằng các mô hình XNLI được nâng cao bởi bộ khung đã đề xuất khả năng vượt trội hơn những mẫu nguyên bản cùng với thiết lập giao tiếp ngôn ngữ rộng.', 'hr': 'Krozjezička prirodna jezika infekcija (XNLI) je temeljni zadatak u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Nedavno se ovaj zadatak često obraća predobučeni međujezički modeli. Postoje metode obično poboljšavaju predobučene jezičke modele s dodatnim podacima, poput annotirane paralelne korpore. Međutim, te dodatne podatke su rijetke u praksi, posebno za jezike niskih resursa. Inspiran nedavnim obećavajućim rezultatima postignutim ubrzano učenjem, ovaj papir predlaže novi okvir na ubrzano učenje baziran na osnovu pojačanja XNLI. To reformira XNLI problem maskiranom jezikom modeliranjem problem a izgradnjem pitanja kloza stila kroz cross-lingual templates. Za primjenu dopisnosti između različitih jezika, okvir povećava novo pitanje za svako pitanje koristeći uzorak šablona na drugom jeziku, a zatim uvodi gubitak konsekvencije kako bi se distribucija vjerojatnosti odgovora dobila iz novog pitanja što je moguće sličnije s odgovarajućim distribucijom dobijenom iz originalnog pitanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dvije baze podataka o kriteriji pokazuju da su modeli XNLI poboljšani našim predloženim okvirom značajno iznosili originalne pod punim snimanjem i nekoliko metaka preko jezičkih prijenosa.', 'bg': 'Междуезичният естествен език е основна задача в междуезичното разбиране на естествения език. Напоследък тази задача често се решава от предварително обучени междуезични езикови модели. Съществуващите методи обикновено подобряват предварително обучените езикови модели с допълнителни данни, като анотирани паралелни корпуси. Тези допълнителни данни обаче са редки на практика, особено за езици с нисък ресурс. Вдъхновена от последните обещаващи резултати, постигнати чрез бързо обучение, тази статия предлага нова рамка, основана на бързо обучение, за подобряване на XNLI. Той преформулира задачата на маскиран проблем за моделиране на езика чрез конструиране на въпроси в стил клоз чрез междуезични шаблони. За да се наложи кореспонденция между различните езици, рамката увеличава нов въпрос за всеки въпрос, използвайки образцов шаблон на друг език и след това въвежда загуба на последователност, за да направи разпределението на вероятността за отговор, получено от новия въпрос, възможно най-близко със съответното разпределение, получено от първоначалния въпрос. Експерименталните резултати на два сравнителни набора от данни показват, че моделите, подобрени от предложената ни рамка, значително превъзхождат оригиналните при настройките за пълен и няколко кадъра междуезичен трансфер.', 'da': 'Tværsproget naturligt sprog inference (XNLI) er en grundlæggende opgave i tværsproget natursprogforståelse. For nylig løses denne opgave ofte af forududdannede tværsprogede sprogmodeller. Eksisterende metoder forbedrer normalt forududdannede sprogmodeller med yderligere data, såsom noterede parallelle korpora. Disse yderligere data er imidlertid sjældne i praksis, især for sprog med lav ressource. Inspireret af de seneste lovende resultater opnået ved prompt-learning, foreslår denne artikel en ny prompt-learning baseret ramme for at forbedre XNLI. Det omformulerer XNLI-problemet til et maskeret sprogmodelleringsproblem ved at konstruere cloze-stil spørgsmål gennem tværsprogede skabeloner. For at håndhæve korrespondancen mellem forskellige sprog forøger rammen et nyt spørgsmål for hvert spørgsmål ved hjælp af en stikprøveudtaget skabelon på et andet sprog og indfører derefter et tab af konsistens for at gøre sandsynlighedsfordelingen for svar fra det nye spørgsmål så ensartet som muligt med den tilsvarende fordeling fra det oprindelige spørgsmål. Eksperimentelle resultater på to benchmarkdatasæt viser, at XNLI-modeller, der er forbedret af vores foreslåede framework, er betydeligt bedre end de oprindelige under både full-shot og få-shot tværsprogede overførselsindstillinger.', 'nl': "Crosslingual Natural Language Inference (XNLI) is een fundamentele taak in crosslingual Natural Language Understanding. Recent wordt deze taak vaak aangepakt door vooraf getrainde meertalige taalmodellen. Bestaande methoden verbeteren meestal voorgetrainde taalmodellen met aanvullende gegevens, zoals geannoteerde parallelle corpora's. Deze aanvullende gegevens zijn echter zeldzaam in de praktijk, vooral voor talen met weinig middelen. Geïnspireerd door recente veelbelovende resultaten bereikt door prompt-learning, stelt deze paper een nieuw prompt-learning gebaseerd framework voor om XNLI te verbeteren. Het herformuleert het XNLI-probleem naar een gemaskeerd taalmodelleringsprobleem door cloze-stijl vragen te construeren via cross-lingual sjablonen. Om correspondentie tussen verschillende talen af te dwingen, voegt het raamwerk voor elke vraag een nieuwe vraag toe met behulp van een monstersjabloon in een andere taal en introduceert vervolgens een consistentieverlies om de antwoordwaarschijnlijkheidsverdeling verkregen uit de nieuwe vraag zo vergelijkbaar mogelijk te maken met de overeenkomstige verdeling verkregen uit de oorspronkelijke vraag. Experimentele resultaten op twee benchmark datasets tonen aan dat XNLI modellen verbeterd door ons voorgestelde framework aanzienlijk beter presteren dan originele modellen onder zowel de full-shot als few-shot cross-lingual transfer instellingen.", 'id': 'Cross-lingual natural language inference (XNLI) is a fundamental task in cross-lingual natural language understanding.  Baru-baru ini tugas ini biasanya diselesaikan oleh model bahasa saling berbahasa yang terlatih sebelumnya. Metode yang ada biasanya meningkatkan model bahasa pra-dilatih dengan data tambahan, seperti corpora paralel anotasi. Data tambahan ini, bagaimanapun, langka dalam praktek, terutama untuk bahasa sumber daya rendah. Terinspirasi oleh hasil yang berjanji baru-baru ini yang dicapai dengan belajar cepat, kertas ini mengusulkan cadangan baru yang berdasarkan belajar cepat untuk meningkatkan XNLI. Ini mengubah masalah XNLI ke masalah model bahasa bertopeng dengan membangun pertanyaan gaya cloze melalui templat saling bahasa. Untuk memaksa korespondensi antara bahasa yang berbeda, kerangka menambah pertanyaan baru untuk setiap pertanyaan menggunakan templat yang dicampur dalam bahasa lain dan kemudian memperkenalkan kehilangan konsistensi untuk membuat distribusi kemungkinan jawaban yang diperoleh dari pertanyaan baru sebanyak mungkin dengan distribusi yang sesuai yang diperoleh dari pertanyaan asli. Hasil percobaan pada dua set data benchmark menunjukkan bahwa model XNLI yang diperbaiki oleh cadangan kami yang direncanakan jauh melebihi yang asli di bawah pengaturan transfer bahasa penuh dan sedikit tembakan.', 'de': 'Cross-lingual Natural Language Inference (XNLI) ist eine grundlegende Aufgabe im crosslingual Natural Language Verständnis. In letzter Zeit wird diese Aufgabe häufig durch vortrainierte sprachübergreifende Modelle adressiert. Bestehende Methoden erweitern in der Regel vortrainierte Sprachmodelle um zusätzliche Daten, wie annotierte parallele Korpora. Diese zusätzlichen Daten sind jedoch in der Praxis selten, insbesondere für ressourcenarme Sprachen. Inspiriert von den jüngsten vielversprechenden Ergebnissen, die durch prompt-learning erzielt wurden, schlägt dieses Papier ein neuartiges prompt-learning basiertes Framework zur Verbesserung von XNLI vor. Es umformuliert das XNLI-Problem in ein maskiertes Sprachmodellierungsproblem, indem cloze-artige Fragen durch mehrsprachige Vorlagen konstruiert werden. Um Korrespondenz zwischen verschiedenen Sprachen zu erzwingen, erweitert das Framework für jede Frage eine neue Frage mithilfe einer Mustervorlage in einer anderen Sprache und führt dann einen Konsistenzverlust ein, um die Antwortwahrscheinlichkeitsverteilung aus der neuen Frage so ähnlich wie möglich mit der entsprechenden Verteilung aus der ursprünglichen Frage zu machen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an zwei Benchmark-Datensätzen zeigen, dass XNLI-Modelle, die durch unser vorgeschlagenes Framework verbessert werden, sowohl bei Vollbild- als auch bei Mehrsprachigkeit-Transfereinstellungen deutlich besser abschneiden.', 'ko': '크로스 언어 자연 언어 추리는 크로스 언어 자연 언어 이해의 기본적인 임무이다.최근 이 임무는 통상적으로 사전에 훈련된 크로스 언어 모델로 해결된다.기존의 방법은 일반적으로 추가 데이터(예를 들어 주석이 있는 평행어 자료 라이브러리)를 사용하여 미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 강화한다.그러나 이러한 추가 데이터는 실천에서 보기 드물며 특히 저자원 언어에 대해서는 드물다.실시간 학습이 얻은 최신 성과의 계발을 받아 본고는 실시간 학습을 바탕으로 하는 새로운 XNLI 강화 구조를 제시했다.이것은 크로스 언어 템플릿을 통해 완형 빈칸 채우기 문제를 구성하여 XNLI 문제를 숨겨진 언어 모델링 문제로 전환시킨다.그리고 다른 샘플링 언어에서 얻은 새로운 문제와 새로운 문제 간의 일치성을 사용하여 다른 샘플링 언어에서 얻은 새로운 문제와 새로운 문제 간의 일치성을 증가시킨다.두 개의 기준 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 전체 렌즈와 작은 렌즈의 크로스 언어 이동 설정에서 우리가 제시한 프레임워크가 강화된 XNLI 모델은 모두 원시 모델보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'عفونت زبان طبیعی (XNLI) یک کار بنیادی در درک زبان طبیعی متوسط زبان است. اخیرا این کار معمولاً توسط مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای مختلف آموزش داده شده است. روش\u200cهای موجود معمولاً مدل\u200cهای زبان پیش آموزش با داده\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای بیشتر، مانند شرکت\u200cهای پارالی مشخص شده، بیشتر می\u200cکند. ولی این داده های اضافی در تمرین نادر هستند، مخصوصا برای زبانهای کم منبع. این کاغذ توسط نتیجه\u200cهای وعده\u200cدهنده اخیر که توسط یادگیری سریع رسیده\u200cاند، یک روزنامه\u200cای که بر پایه\u200cی یادگیری پیشنهاد می\u200cکند، برای افزایش XNLI است. این مشکل XNLI را به یک مشکل مدل کردن زبان ماسک تغییر می\u200cدهد با ساختن سوال\u200cهای سبک کلوز با شکل\u200cهای متفاوت زبان. برای اجرای ارتباط بین زبانهای مختلف، چهارچوب یک سوال جدید برای هر سوال با استفاده از نمونه\u200cهای نمونه\u200cای در زبان دیگر افزایش می\u200cدهد و سپس خسارت هماهنگی را معرفی می\u200cکند تا توزیع احتمال پاسخ را از سوال جدید به اندازه\u200cای که ممکن است به اندازه توزیع\u200cهای متفاوتی نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی دو مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مقداری نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل XNLI توسط چهارچوب پیشنهاد ما بیشتر از آن\u200cها که اصلی را تحت تنظیمات انتقال\u200cهای کامل و کوچک زبان\u200cهای زیادی بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'tr': "Çapraz diller tebigat dilleriniň azalyşygy (XNLI) çerçe-diller tebigat dilleriniň düşünmesinde esasy zady. Soňky wagtlar bu zady öňki bilim alçan dil nusgalaryna görkezilýär. Öň bar taryşlar adatça öňünden eğlenen dil nusgalaryny ekleýän hatlary, parallel korpora ýaly tanyş edilen hatlary bilen köpräk görkez. Şu ýene-de bu maglumat praktikadan nadir, ýöne iň az ressurs dilleri üçin. Ýakynda sowgat öwrenmek üçin ýetişik gelen wezip netijeleri tarapyndan täsir edildi, bu kagyz XNLI'i geliştirmek üçin täze bir täze öwrenmek sistemasyny teklip edýär. XNLI meseleni çarpaz dil modlemesi bilen cloz stili soraglary düzenleyerek maskeli dillere üýtgedýär. Farklı diller arasynda täze bir soragy täzeden edip bilmek üçin, çerçewde her soragy başga dilde örnek görkezilen çäpden täze bir soragy üýtgedýär we soňra başlangyç soragyndan alan çäpden çykyş etmek üçin täze soragyň mümkinçiligi täze soragyndan elip alan çäpden ç Iki benchmark sanatyndaky örän netijeleri XNLI modelleriň biziň teklip edilen çerçewçibimiz tarapyndan dyýarlygyny hem doly atly, hem birnäçe atly çarpaz dil transferi düzümleriniň altynda örän köpräk taýýarlar.", 'sw': 'Ukosefu wa lugha ya asili (XNLI) ni kazi ya msingi katika kuelewa lugha ya asili ya lugha. Hivi karibuni jukumu hili linazungumzwa mara nyingi na mifano ya lugha zilizojifunza kabla. mbinu zilizopo mara nyingi huongeza mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla kwa takwimu za ziada, kama vile makampuni yanayochanganyika. These additional data, however, are rare in practice, especially for low-resource languages.  Kuhamishwa na matokeo ya kutarajiwa hivi karibuni yaliyotokana na kujifunza kwa haraka, gazeti hili linapendekeza mfumo wa kujifunza kwa haraka wa riwaya kwa ajili ya kuongeza XNLI. Inabadilisha tatizo la XNLI kwa tatizo la kuonyesha lugha yenye maudhui kwa kujenga maswali yanayotokana na mihula ya lugha. Kulazimisha mawasiliano kati ya lugha tofauti, mfumo huo unaongeza swali mpya kwa kila maswali kwa kutumia namba ya sampuli kwa lugha nyingine na baadae inaonyesha kupoteza kwa uwezekano wa kusambaza jibu kutoka kwa swali mpya kama inavyowezekana na usambazaji wa maswali ya msingi. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti mbili za bendera yanaonyesha kuwa miundo mbili ya XNLI imeongezeka na mfumo wetu wa pendekezo unaoendelea vizuri vikubwa vya awali chini ya mazingira ya usafirishaji wa lugha chache zilizopigwa risasi.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ግንኙነት (XNLI) በተለየ ቋንቋ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማስተዋል መሠረት ነው፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ ይህ ስራ አስቀድሞ በተወሰነ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች ይታወቃል። Existing methods usually enhance pre-trained language models with additional data, such as annotated parallel corpora.  ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ የጨዋታ ዳርቻዎች በተግባር በጣም ጥቂቶች ናቸው ይልቁንም ለጥቂት የክፍለ ዕቃ ቋንቋዎች ናቸው፡፡ በቅርብ ጊዜ በተስፋ ትምህርት የተደረገውን የፍሬዎች ውጤቶች በማግኘት፣ ይህ ፕሮግራም በXNLI ለማበረጅም የኖሮው ትምህርት መሠረት መሠረትን ያስጀምራል፡፡ የXNLI ችግር በመስመር ቋንቋ አካባቢ ጉዳይ በኩል-ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በመሠረት ላይ ያስተካክላል፡፡ በልዩ ቋንቋዎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለማስፈልግ፣ ፍሬማርክ አዲስ ጥያቄን ለሁሉም ጥያቄ በሌላ ቋንቋ በተጨማሪው መልዕክት እና በመጀመሪያው ጥያቄ የተገኘውን መልስ አዲስ ጥያቄ እንዲያሳየው አዲስ ጥያቄ ያስችላል፡፡ በሁለት benchmark ዳታዎች ላይ የተፈተና ውጤቶች የXNLI ሞዴላዎች በተዘጋጀን የፍሬም ክፍተት በሙሉ-shot እና በጥቂት የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መተላለፊያ ማዘጋጀት ውስጥ የበለጠ መሆኑን ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Përfundimi i gjuhës natyrore ndërgjuhësore (XNLI) është një detyrë thelbësore në kuptimin e gjuhës natyrore ndërgjuhësore. Recently this task is commonly addressed by pre-trained cross-language models. Metodat ekzistuese zakonisht përmirësojnë modelet e gjuhës paratrajnuar me të dhëna shtesë, të tilla si korpra paralele të anotuar. Këto të dhëna shtesë, megjithatë, janë të rralla në praktikë, veçanërisht për gjuhët me burime të ulëta. Inspiruar nga rezultatet premtuese të fundit të arritura nga mësimi i shpejtë, ky dokument propozon një kuadër të ri të bazuar në mësim të shpejtë për përmirësimin e XNLI. Ajo reformulon problemin XNLI në një problem modelimi gjuhësh maskuar duke ndërtuar pyetje stili cloze nëpërmjet modeleve ndërgjuhësore. Për të zbatuar korrespondencën midis gjuhëve të ndryshme, kuadri shton një pyetje të re për çdo pyetje duke përdorur një modelin e marrë në një gjuhë tjetër dhe pastaj fut një humbje konsistence për të bërë shpërndarjen e probabilitetit të përgjigjes të marrë nga pyetja e re sa më të ngjashme sa më të jetë e mundur me shpërndarjen korrespondente të marrë nga pyetja ori Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy baza të dhënash tregojnë se modelet XNLI të përmirësuar nga kuadri ynë i propozuar arrijnë në mënyrë të konsiderueshme ato origjinale nën rregullimet e transferimit ndërgjuhësor me fotografi të plotë dhe pak fotografi.', 'hy': 'Խոսքերի միջև բնական լեզվի եզրակացությունը (XNSI) հիմնական խնդիր է լեզվի միջև բնական հասկանալու համար: Վերջերս այս խնդիրը սովորաբար լուծվում է նախապատրաստված լեզվի փոխլեզվի մոդելների կողմից: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները սովորաբար բարելավում են նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները ավելացյալ տվյալներով, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ annoted զուգահեռ կորպորան: These additional data, however, are rare in practice, especially for low-resource languages.  Հոգեշնչված վերջերս խոստացող արդյունքներով, որոնք հասել են արագ սովորելու միջոցով, այս թղթին առաջարկում է նոր արագ սովորելու հիմնված շրջանակ XNSI-ի բարելավման համար: Այն վերաձևավորում է XNSI-ի խնդիրը դեպի թաքնված լեզվի մոդելավորման խնդիր՝ կառուցելով գլխավոր հարցեր երկլեզվային մոդելների միջոցով: Տարբեր լեզուների միջև հաղորդակցվելու համար շրջանակը ավելացնում է յուրաքանչյուր հարցի նոր հարցը, օգտագործելով մեկ այլ լեզվով ընտրված օրինակ, և հետո ներկայացնում է կորստիկանության կորուստ, որպեսզի նոր հարցից ստացված պատասխանի հավանականության բաշխման հավանականությունը որքան հնարա Երկու համեմատային տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ XNSI-ի մոդելները, որոնք բարելավվել են մեր առաջարկած շրջանակներով, զգացողորեն գերազանցում են արտահայտված սկզբնական մոդելները, ինչպես լիարժեք և քիչ նկա', 'az': "XNLI, çox dilli təbiətli dil dəyişikliği, çox dilli təbiətli dil anlayışında əsl bir işdir. Son zamanlarda bu işin çox təhsil edilmiş çox dil modelləri ilə istifadə edilir. Existing metodlar genellikle əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modellərini, həmçinin paralel korpora kimi məlumatları ilə artırar. Ancaq bu əlavə məlumatlar praksiyada nadir, özlərinə də zəif ressurs dilləri üçün. Bu kağıt XNLI'ni artırmaq üçün yeni tələb edən vədlər sonuçlarından təşkil edildi. XNLI problemini, çox dil modülləri vasitəsilə kloz stili suallarını inşa edərək maskəli dil modellərinin probleminə dəyişdirir. Farklı dillər arasındakı məlumatları təsdiqləmək üçün, frameworklər hər sual üçün yeni bir sual artırar, başqa dildə örnəkli şablon istifadə edərək, sonra yeni sual təsdiqlənməsi üçün mümkün olduğu qədər yeni sual təsdiqlənməsi üçün müəyyən edilən mümkün olduğu qədər yeni sual təsdiqlənməsi üçün bir sür İki benchmark veri qurduğu təcrübə sonuçlarının XNLI modellərinin bizim təklif etdiyimiz qurduğumuz qurduğumuz qurduğumuz qurduğumuz qurduğumuz hər ikisinin tam atlı və az dil qarşılaşdırılma qurduğu qurduğu təcrübə", 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার আক্রান্ত (এক্সএনলি) একটি মৌলিক কাজ যা ক্রাশ ভাষাভাষায় প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা বুঝানোর ব সম্প্রতি পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত প্রাক্তন ভাষার মডেল দ্বারা এই কাজের কথা বলা হয়। বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি সাধারণত পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেলের সাথে আরো তথ্যের মাধ্যমে বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করে, যেমন বিরক্তিকর প্ তবে এই অতিরিক্ত তথ্য প্রক্রিয়ায় কম, বিশেষ করে কম সম্পদ ভাষার জন্য। সম্প্রতি প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল দ্রুত শিক্ষা দ্বারা অর্জন করেছে, এই পত্রিকা এক্সএনলির উন্নতির জন্য একটি নোভেল শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক ক কাঠামো  এটি ক্লোজ-শৈল্পিক প্রশ্ন নির্মাণ করার মাধ্যমে এক্সএনলির সমস্যার সংস্কার করে মুখোশিত ভাষার মডেলিং সমস্যার সংস্কার করে। ভিন্ন ভাষার মধ্যে সংবাদ বাধ্য করার জন্য, ফ্রেম কাঠামোটি অন্য ভাষায় একটি নমুনা মন্তব্য ব্যবহার করে প্রতিটি প্রশ্নের জন্য একটি নতুন প্রশ্ন যোগ করে এবং তারপর নতুন প্রশ্নের বিতরণের সম্ভ দুই বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করেছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফ্রেমের মাধ্যমে এক্সএনলি মডেল বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করেছে পুরোপুরি গুলি এবং ক', 'ca': "La inferència de llenguatges naturals translingües (XNLI) és una tasca fonamental en la comprensió de llenguatges naturals translingües. Recentment aquesta tasca es tracta comument per models de llenguatges translingües pré-entrenats. Els mètodes existents normalment milloren els models de llenguatge pré-entrenats amb dades adicionals, com la corpora paral·lela anotata. These additional data, however, are rare in practice, especially for low-resource languages.  Inspired by recent promising results achieved by prompt-learning, this paper proposes a novel prompt-learning based framework for enhancing XNLI.  Reforma el problem a XNLI a un problema de modelació de llengües mascarat construint preguntes d'estil cloze a través de models translingües. Per aplicar la corresponència entre les diferents llengües, el marc augmenta una nova pregunta per cada pregunta utilitzant un model de mostra en un altre llenguatge i introdueix una pèrdua de consistencia per fer la distribució de probabilitat de resposta obtenida de la nova pregunta tan similar com possible a la distribució correspondent obtenida de la pregunta original. Els resultats experimentals de dos conjunts de dades de referència demostren que els models XNLI millorats pel nostre marc proposat superen significativament els originals sota les configuracions de transfer ència interlingüística completa i poca.", 'bs': 'Krozjezička prirodna jezika infekcija (XNLI) je fundamentalni zadatak u razumijevanju prirodnog jezika. Nedavno se ovaj zadatak često obraća predobučeni međujezički modeli. Postoje metode obično poboljšavaju predobučene jezičke modele s dodatnim podacima, kao što su annotirane paralelne korpore. Međutim, ovi dodatni podaci su rijetki u praksi, posebno za jezike niskih resursa. Inspiran nedavnim obećavajućim rezultatima postignutim ubrzano učenjem, ovaj papir predlaže novi okvir na ubrzano učenje baziran na osnovu pojačanja XNLI. To reformiše XNLI problem maskiranom jezikom modeliranjem problem a izgradnjem pitanja kloza stila kroz cross-lingual templates. Za primjenu dopisnosti između različitih jezika, okvir povećava novo pitanje za svako pitanje koristeći uzorak šablona na drugim jezicima i onda predstavlja gubitak konsekvencije kako bi se distribucija vjerojatnosti odgovora dobila iz novog pitanja što je moguće sličnije s odgovarajućim distribucijom dobijenom iz originalnog pitanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva standardna seta podataka pokazuju da su modeli XNLI poboljšani od našeg predloženog okvira značajno iznosili originalne pod punim snimanjem i nekoliko metaka preko jezika.', 'cs': 'Interlinguální inference přirozeného jazyka (XNLI) je základním úkolem v crosslinguálním porozumění přirozenému jazyce. V poslední době je tento úkol běžně řešen předem školenými cross-jazyčnými modely. Stávající metody obvykle rozšiřují předškolené jazykové modely o další data, například anotované paralelní korpusy. Tyto dodatečné údaje jsou však v praxi vzácné, zejména u jazyků s nízkými zdroji. Inspirován nedávnými slibnými výsledky dosaženými rychlým učením, tento článek navrhuje nový rámec založený na rychlém učení pro zlepšení XNLI. Přeformuluje XNLI problém na maskovaný jazykový modelování problém konstruováním cloze-stylu otázek prostřednictvím vícejazyčných šablon. Pro vynucení korespondence mezi různými jazyky rámec rozšiřuje novou otázku pro každou otázku pomocí vzorkované šablony v jiném jazyce a následně zavádí ztrátu konzistence, aby rozložení pravděpodobnosti odpovědi získané z nové otázky bylo co nejvíce podobné odpovídajícímu rozdělení získanému z původní otázky. Experimentální výsledky na dvou referenčních datových sadách ukazují, že modely XNLI vylepšené naším navrženým rámcem výrazně překonávají původní modely jak při full-shot, tak pár-shot cross-jazyčných nastaveních přenosu.', 'et': 'Keeleülene looduskeele järeldus (XNLI) on keeleülese looduskeele mõistmise põhiülesanne. Hiljuti on seda ülesannet tavaliselt käsitletud eelnevalt koolitatud keeleüleste keelemudelitega. Olemasolevad meetodid täiustavad tavaliselt eelõpetatud keelemudeleid täiendavate andmetega, näiteks annoteeritud paralleelsete korpustega. Need täiendavad andmed on aga praktikas haruldased, eriti vähese ressursiga keelte puhul. Kiirõppega saavutatud hiljutistest paljutõotavatest tulemustest inspireerituna pakutakse käesolevas dokumendis välja uus kiirõppel põhinev raamistik XNLI täiustamiseks. See vormistab XNLI probleemi ümber maskeeritud keele modelleerimise probleemiks, luues kloze-stiilis küsimused läbi keeleüleste mallide. Erinevate keelte vahelise kirjavahetuse jõustamiseks lisab raamistik iga küsimuse kohta uue küsimuse, kasutades valimimalli mõnes teises keeles, ja seejärel lisab järjepidevuse kadu, et uuest küsimusest saadud vastuse tõenäosusjaotus oleks võimalikult sarnane algküsimusest saadud vastava jaotusega. Kahe võrdlusandmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie kavandatud raamistikuga täiustatud XNLI mudelid ületavad oluliselt algseid mudeleid nii täis- kui ka vähese võttega keeleülekande seadete puhul.', 'af': "Kruistale natuurlike taal inferensie (XNLI) is 'n fundamentele taak in kruistale natuurlike taal verstanding. Onlangs is hierdie taak gewoonlik ingeadres deur vooraf-opgelei kruistale taal modele. Bestaande metodes het gewoonlik voor- opgelei taal modele met addisionele data verhoog, soos aanmerk parallele korpora. Hierdie addisionele data is egter onheilig in praksie, veral vir lae hulpbron tale. Inspireer deur onlangse beloftende resultate wat deur prompt-leer bereik word, hierdie papier voorstel 'n roman prompt-leer gebaseerde raamwerk vir verbetering van XNLI. Name Om ooreenkomstigheid tussen verskillende tale te vervul, die raamwerk vergroot 'n nuwe vraag vir elke vraag deur te gebruik 'n voorbeeld sjabloon in 'n ander taal en dan introduseer 'n konsistensie verlies om die antwoord waarskynlik verspreiding te maak wat van die nuwe vraag as gelykbaar as moontlik verkry word met die ooreenko Eksperimentale resultate op twee benchmark datastelle vertoon dat XNLI-modele deur ons voorgestelde raamwerk betekeurig oorspronklike uitvoer onder beide die volle-skoot en paar-skoot kruistale oordragstellings.", 'fi': 'Kieltenvälinen luonnonkielen päättely (XNLI) on keskeinen tehtävä monikielisen luonnonkielen ymmärtämisessä. Viime aikoina tähän tehtävään on yleisesti vastattu ennalta koulutetuilla kielimallilla. Nykyiset menetelmät parantavat yleensä ennalta koulutettuja kielimalleja lisätiedoilla, kuten merkityillä rinnakkaiskorpusilla. Nämä lisätiedot ovat kuitenkin käytännössä harvinaisia erityisesti vähävaraisten kielten osalta. Tuoreimpien lupaavien tulosten innoittamana tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan uudenlaista pikaoppimiseen perustuvaa kehystä XNLI:n parantamiseksi. Se muotoilee XNLI-ongelman uudelleen peitellyksi kielimallinnusongelmaksi rakentamalla cloze-tyylisiä kysymyksiä monikielisten mallipohjien avulla. Eri kielten välisen kirjeenvaihdon varmistamiseksi viitekehys lisää jokaiselle kysymykselle uuden kysymyksen käyttämällä esimerkkimallia toisella kielellä ja sitten tuo johdonmukaisuuden menetyksen, jotta uudesta kysymyksestä saatu vastaustodennäköisyysjakauma olisi mahdollisimman samanlainen alkuperäisen kysymyksen vastaavan jakauman kanssa. Kokeelliset tulokset kahdesta vertailuaineistosta osoittavat, että ehdotetulla viitekehyksellämme parannetut XNLI-mallit ovat huomattavasti parempia kuin alkuperäiset sekä täyden että muutaman kuvan monikielisen siirron asetuksissa.', 'jv': 'Global file text-tool-action Opo, dadi tambah menyang dipunangé iki dadi luwih jarang ing pratik, ngomong kanggo langgambar kelas pengguna kuwi. Yongyang mbut-mbut sing paling-uwong sing gawe mbut-ingkang alih lan ijol-ijol, paper iki supoyo kuwi nyumbang mbut-ijol sing basa kanggo nglanggar XNLI. Rasane transform XNLI kesemplan nganggep modèling langgambar kelangan seng nggawe kesemplan daftar ar ar banter-kelangan templates. Ngawe nggap perusahaan langkung sampeyan ing tindang sampeyan Perintah sing dipontrolan karo dataset sing kelas alih dumadhi bisa ngomong nik model XNLI sing bisa supoyo nggawe barang kelas supoyo nggawe barang langkung enelah sistem sing dumadhi iki dadi sampeyan ngon ketahan pangang langkung', 'ha': "@ label: listbox @ info: whatsthis @ action: inmenu @ info: whatsthis An Inspire shi da fassarar da ake yi wa'adi na farkon da aka aiko ta da amfani da farat-lõkaci, wannan takarda yana bukãtar da wani firam na kwanan-da-gyare wa ƙaranci XNLI. Yana yin gyarawa ga matabbatar XNLI zuwa wata matabbata mai nuna cikin harshen da aka rufe shi, yana samun masu tambayar tsohon-salon da ke samar da cikin masallatan-faɗi. To, dõmin ya lazimta mai daidaita tsakanin harshen dabam-daban, firam ɗin zai augutar da wani tambayi na daban a yi amfani da wani nambar misali da wani harshe na daban kuma ya ƙara wata hasãra mai daidai dõmin ya sanya rabo mai yiwuwa daga tambayi na yanzu kamar da yake iya daidai da rabon da inganci na sami daga tambayi na farko. Matarin jarrabãwa ta kan danna biyu na bangon-bangon sun nuna cewa misalin XNLI da aka ƙara shi da kuma a goyi amfani da firam masu buƙata da ƙayyade kwance, suna ƙaranci da tsarin transfer-lugha guda-shekara.", 'sk': 'Medjezični sklep naravnega jezika (XNLI) je temeljna naloga pri razumevanju medjezičnega naravnega jezika. V zadnjem času to nalogo običajno obravnavajo vnaprej usposobljeni medjezični jezikovni modeli. Obstoječe metode običajno izboljšujejo vnaprej usposobljene jezikovne modele z dodatnimi podatki, kot so vzporedni korpusi z oznakami. Vendar so ti dodatni podatki v praksi redki, zlasti za jezike z nizkimi viri. Ta prispevek, ki ga navdihujejo nedavni obetavni rezultati, doseženi s hitrim učenjem, predlaga nov okvir, ki temelji na hitrem učenju, za izboljšanje XNLI. Problem XNLI preoblikuje v problem masked jezikovnega modeliranja s konstruiranjem vprašanj v slogu kloze prek večjezičnih predlog. Za uveljavljanje korespondence med različnimi jeziki okvir poveča novo vprašanje za vsako vprašanje z uporabo vzorčene predloge v drugem jeziku in nato uvaja izgubo skladnosti, da bi bila verjetnostna porazdelitev odgovora, pridobljena iz novega vprašanja, čim bolj podobna ustrezni porazdelitvi, pridobljeni iz prvotnega vprašanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dveh referenčnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da modeli XNLI, ki jih je izboljšal naš predlagani okvir, znatno presegajo originalne pri nastavitvah prenosa polnega in nekaj posnetkov med jezikom.', 'he': 'משימה בסיסית בהבנת שפת טבעית בין שפתים. לאחרונה המשימה הזאת מוטפלת בדרך כלל על ידי דוגמני שפת צלולת מאומנים מראש. שיטות קיימות בדרך כלל משפרות דוגמנים לשפה מאומנים מראש עם נתונים נוספים, כמו גופורה מקבילה מוכתבת. אבל הנתונים הנוספים האלה נדירים במעשה, במיוחד לשפות עם משאבים נמוכים. בהשראה בתוצאות מבטיחות לאחרונה שנוצאות על ידי לימוד מהיר, העיתון הזה מציע מסגרת חדשה מבוססת לימוד מהיר לשיפור XNLI. הוא מחדש את הבעיה של XNLI לבעיה של דוגמנית שפות מסוכנת על ידי בניית שאלות בסגנון קלוז דרך דוגמנים שפותיים. כדי להפעיל התכתבות בין שפות שונות, המסגרת מגדילה שאלה חדשה לכל שאלה באמצעות דוגמא נבחרת בשפה אחרת ואז מכניסה אבדן קבילות כדי להפוך את ההפצה של סבירות התשובה שנקבלה מהשאלה החדשה ככל האפשר עם ההפצה המתאימה שנקבלה מהשאלה המקורית. תוצאות ניסיוניות על שני קבוצות מידע רנטרל מראות שדוגמנים XNLI ששותפים על ידי המסגר המוצע שלנו משתפרים באופן משמעותי את המקורי תחת התקנות העברה בין השפתיים המלאה ומעט.', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual natural language inference (XNLI)ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤིག་རེད། སྔོན་ལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་བསྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱིས་དཔེ་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད། Existing methods usually enhance pre-trained language models with additional data, such as annotated parallel corpora. ཡིན་ནའང་། བྱ་སྤྱོད་ནང་དུ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་དག་ལས་ཉུང་བར་ཆེ་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་XNLI ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བའི་ཁས་འཆར་བའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་གསལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་གསར་གཏོང་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་དེ་རྟོགས་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་XNLI་ཡི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཅིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅིག་གསར་བཟོ སྐད་རིགས་མ་འདྲ་བའི་དབར་གྱི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ལས། རྒྱུ་གཞུང་གིས་འདྲི་ཚིག་རེ་རེ་རེར་སྤྱོད་ནས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཅིག Experimental results on two benchmark datasets demonstrate that XNLI models enhanced by our proposed framework improved by the original ones significantly outperform both the full-shot and few-shot cross-lingual transfer settings below.'}
{'en': 'Program Transfer for Answering Complex Questions over Knowledge Bases', 'ar': 'الضمانات الحسية متحيزة أيضًا - تقييم التحيزات الاجتماعية في الضمانات ذات المعنى الثابت والسياقي', 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de sentidos también están sesgadas: evaluación de los sesgos sociales en las incrustaciones de sentidos estáticas y contextualizadas', 'pt': 'As incorporações de sentido também são tendenciosas – avaliando preconceitos sociais em incorporações de sentido estáticas e contextualizadas', 'fr': 'Les intégrations sensorielles sont également biaisées — Évaluation des biais sociaux dans les intégrations de sens statiques et contextualisées', 'zh': '感官亦有偏见 —— 静态情有偏见', 'hi': 'सेंस एम्बेडिंग भी पक्षपाती हैं - स्थैतिक और प्रासंगिक भावना एम्बेडिंग में सामाजिक पूर्वाग्रहों का मूल्यांकन करना', 'ru': 'Вложения чувств также предвзяты - оценка социальных предрассудков в статических и контекстуализированных вложениях чувств', 'ja': 'Sense Embeddings are also biased -- Evaluating Social Bias in Static and Contextualized Sense Embeddings', 'ga': 'Tá Leabaithe Sense Claonadh freisin -- Ag Measúnú Laofachtaí Sóisialta i Leabaithe Smaointe Statach agus Comhthéacsúla', 'ka': 'სტატიკური და კონტექსტუალური სტატიკური შეგრძნობების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Οι ενσωματώσεις αισθήσεων είναι επίσης προκατειλημμένες. Αξιολόγηση κοινωνικών προκαταλήψεων σε στατικές και περιεκτικές ενσωματώσεις αισθήσεων', 'hu': 'Az érzékelési beágyazások szintén félreértve vannak -- A társadalmi félreértések értékelése statikus és kontextualizált érzékelési beágyazásokban', 'kk': 'Сеніс ендірулері сондай-ақ көлемді - Статикалық және контекстуалды сезім ендірулерінің әлемдік көлемін оқу', 'it': 'Anche gli embedding dei sensi sono biased - Valutazione dei biasi sociali negli embedding dei sensi statici e contestualizzati', 'ml': 'സെന്\u200dസ് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളും ബൈസഡ് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു. - സ്റ്റാറ്റിക്കിലെ സാമൂഹ്യ ബൈസുകളെയും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mk': 'Вградувањата на чувствата се, исто така, навредени -- Оценувањето на социјалните навреди во статичките и контекстуалните вградувања на чувствата', 'mt': 'Sense Embeddings are also Biased -- Evaluating Social Biases in Static and Contextualised Sense Embeddings', 'mn': 'Мөн сэтгэл хөдлөл нь бага зэрэг бага зэрэг бага зэрэг бага зэрэг байдаг.', 'no': 'Sense innbygging er også større – Evaluerer sosiale økningar i statistiske og kontekstualiserte følelsesinnbygging', 'pl': 'Osadzania Sense są również uprzedzone; Ocena uprzedzeń społecznych w osadzeniach statycznych i kontekstualnych', 'lt': 'Senso įdėjiniai taip pat pažeidžiami -- Socialinių pažeidimų vertinimas statinėse ir kontekstinėse Senso įdėjinėse', 'ro': 'Încorporările simțurilor sunt, de asemenea, Biased -- Evaluarea Biased Social în Încorporările simțurilor statice și contextualizate', 'sr': 'Oslobađanja osećanja su takođe povećana -- procjenjivanje socijalnih povećanja u statističkim i kontekstualiziranim oslobađanjima', 'ms': 'Pencampuran Sensa juga Diputuskan -- Menghargai Pencampuran Sensa Sosial dalam Pencampuran Sensa Statik dan Konteksual', 'si': 'සංවේදනය සම්පූර්ණය සහ සංවේදනය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය', 'so': 'Xaaladaha daryeelka soo degaanka waxaa sidoo kale lagu dhibaataysaa - Qiimeynta dhibaatooyinka bulshada ee xasaradaha iyo xasaradaha', 'sv': 'Sense Embeddings är också Biased – Utvärdering av sociala Biases i statiska och kontextualiserade Sense Embeddings', 'ta': 'உணர்வு உட்பொதிகளும் பைச் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது - நிலையில் மற்றும் சூழ்நிலைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட உணர்வு உள்ளடக்கங்களை பரிசோதிக', 'ur': 'Sense Embeddings are also Biased - Evaluating Social Biases in Static and Contextualized Sense Embeddings', 'uz': 'Sensor maydonlari - Statik va taʼminlov qilingan seanslarda jamiyat hayotini tasdiqlash', 'vi': 'Các kiểu đệm cảm xúc cũng được chiếu theo biểu tượng', 'hr': 'Oslobađanja osjećaja također su povećana -- procjenjivanje socijalnih povećanja u statističkim i kontekstualiziranim integracijama osjećaja', 'bg': 'Вградванията на сетивата също са наклонени - оценка на социалните наклонности в статични и контекстуализирани вграждания на сетивата', 'nl': 'Sense Embeddings zijn ook Biased; Evalueren van sociale vooroordelen in statische en contextualiseerde Sense Embeddings', 'da': 'Sense Embeddings er også biased - Evaluering af sociale biases i statiske og kontekstualiserede sanse Embeddings', 'id': 'Sense Embeddings juga Biased -- Evaluasi Social Biases in Static and Contextualized Sense Embeddings', 'de': 'Sense-Einbettungen sind auch Biased. Bewertung sozialer Biases in statischen und kontextualisierten Sense-Einbettungen', 'ko': '의미 삽입도 편견이 있다. 정태와 어경화 의미 삽입 중의 사회 편견을 평가하는 것이다.', 'fa': 'وارد شدن احساسات همچنین بیشتر می شوند -- ارزیابی افزایش اجتماعی در وارد شدن احساسات آمار و متوسط', 'sw': 'Mazingira ya Sensi pia yamepunguzwa – Kupitia Matumio ya Kijamii katika Mazungumzo ya Matukio ya Matukio ya Matukio', 'tr': 'Sense Insertments are also Biased -- Social Biases in Static and Contextualized Sense Embeddings', 'af': 'Sense Inbeeldings word ook verbeter -- Evalueer sosiale besigtigings in Statiese en Konteksualiseerde Sense Inbeeldings', 'sq': 'Embeddinget e ndjenjave janë gjithashtu të mërzitura -- vlerësimi i mërzitjeve sociale në Embeddinget e ndjenjave statike dhe kontekstuale', 'am': 'የሳንሱር አካባቢዎች እና ማኅበራዊ ደካማዎች በስቴት እና በተቃዋሚ የሳንሱር እቅድ ላይ በማስተዋል', 'hy': 'Sense Embeddings are also Biased -- Evaluating Social Biases in Static and Contextualised Sense Embeddings', 'az': 'Sense ńįfad…ôl…ôri d…ô DaŇüdńĪrńĪlńĪr -- Statik v…ô Kontekst Sense ńįfad…ôl…ôrind…ô Sosyal ńįfad…ôl…ôri QńĪdńĪrlar', 'bn': 'সেন্স এমবিডিং বাইজ করা হয়েছে- স্ট্যাটিক এবং বিস্তারিত সামাজিক বায়াস পরিচালিত করা হচ্ছে।', 'ca': 'Sense Embeddings are also Biased -- Evaluating Social Biases in Static and Contextualised Sense Embeddings', 'cs': 'Hodnocení sociálních předsudků ve statických a kontextualizovaných vkládáních smyslu', 'et': 'Samuti on sense manustamised kallakujulised - sotsiaalsete kallakute hindamine staatilistes ja kontekstualiseeritud sense manustamistes', 'bs': 'Oslobađanja osjećaja su također povećana -- procjenjivanje socijalnih povećanja u statističkim i kontekstualiziranim integracijama osjećaja', 'fi': 'Sense Embeddings on myös Biased - Sosiaalisten Biasien arviointi staattisissa ja kontekstualisoituissa Sense Embeddings', 'jv': 'Kelangan Sense Ingkang Biweke Biweke -- Oweke nggawe Biweke Soale nan Stat karo Kontextual Sense', 'sk': 'Tudi vdelave smisla so pristranske - ocenjevanje socialnih pristranskosti v statičnih in kontekstualiziranih vdelavah smisla', 'he': 'התקפידות רגשות הן גם מעורבות -- הערכה של התקפידות חברתיות בתקפידות רגשות סטטיות', 'ha': 'Ana Bayan da aka Sake', 'bo': 'Sense Embeddings are also Biased -- Social Biases in Static and Contextualized Sense Embeddings are Evaluating Social Biases in Static and Contextualized Sense Embeddings'}
{'en': 'Program induction for answering complex questions over knowledge bases KBs aims to decompose a question into a multi step program whose execution against the KB produces the final answer Learning to induce programs relies on a large number of parallel question program pairs for the given KB However for most KBs the gold program annotations are usually lacking making learning difficult In this paper we propose the approach of program transfer which aims to leverage the valuable program annotations on the rich resourced KBs as external supervision signals to aid program induction for the low resourced KBs   that lack program annotations For program transfer we design a novel two stage parsing framework with an efficient ontology guided pruning strategy First a sketch parser translates the question into a high level program sketch which is the composition of functions Second given the question and sketch an argument parser searches the detailed arguments from the KB for functions During the searching we incorporate the KB ontology to prune the search space The experiments on ComplexWebQuestions and WebQuestionSP show that our method outperforms SOTA methods significantly demonstrating the effectiveness of program transfer and our framework Our codes and datasets can be obtained from https://github.com/THU-KEG/ProgramTransfer', 'es': 'Los métodos de aprendizaje de incrustación de sentidos aprenden diferentes incrustaciones para los diferentes sentidos de una palabra ambigua. \nUn sentido de una palabra ambigua puede estar sesgado socialmente, mientras que sus otros sentidos permanecen imparciales. \nEn comparación con los numerosos trabajos previos que evalúan los sesgos sociales en las incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas, los sesgos en la incrustación de sentidos han sido relativamente poco estudiados. \nCreamos un conjunto de datos de referencia para evaluar los sesgos sociales en las incorporaciones sensoriales y proponemos nuevas medidas de evaluación de sesgos específicos de los sentidos. \nLlevamos a cabo una evaluación exhaustiva de múltiples inserciones de sentido estáticas y contextualizadas para varios tipos de sesgos sociales utilizando las medidas propuestas. \nNuestros resultados experimentales muestran que incluso en los casos en que no se encuentran sesgos a nivel de palabra, todavía existen niveles preocupantes de sesgos sociales a nivel sensorial, que a menudo son ignorados por las medidas de evaluación de sesgos a nivel de palabra.', 'ar': 'تتعلم طرق التعلم المتضمنة الحسية حفلات الزفاف المختلفة للحواس المختلفة للكلمة الغامضة.\nقد يكون إحساس كلمة غامضة متحيزًا اجتماعيًا بينما تظل حواسها الأخرى غير متحيزة.\nبالمقارنة مع العديد من الأعمال السابقة التي تقيّم التحيزات الاجتماعية في حفلات الزفاف المدروسة مسبقًا ، فإن التحيزات في حفلات الزفاف المعنى قد تم تجاهلها نسبيًا.\nنقوم بإنشاء مجموعة بيانات معيارية لتقييم التحيزات الاجتماعية في حفلات الزفاف ذات المعنى واقتراح تدابير جديدة لتقييم التحيز خاصة بالمعنى.\nنجري تقييمًا شاملاً للعديد من حفلات الزفاف الثابتة والمتوافقة مع السياق لأنواع مختلفة من التحيزات الاجتماعية باستخدام التدابير المقترحة.\nتظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أنه حتى في الحالات التي لا توجد فيها تحيزات على مستوى الكلمات ، لا تزال هناك مستويات مقلقة من التحيزات الاجتماعية على مستوى المعنى ، والتي غالبًا ما يتم تجاهلها من خلال مقاييس تقييم التحيز على مستوى الكلمة.', 'pt': 'Os métodos de aprendizagem de incorporação de sentido aprendem diferentes incorporações para os diferentes sentidos de uma palavra ambígua.\nUm sentido de uma palavra ambígua pode ser socialmente tendencioso, enquanto seus outros sentidos permanecem imparciais.\nEm comparação com os numerosos trabalhos anteriores avaliando os preconceitos sociais em incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas, os preconceitos em incorporações de sentido têm sido relativamente pouco estudados.\nCriamos um conjunto de dados de referência para avaliar os vieses sociais em incorporações de sentido e propomos novas medidas de avaliação de viés específico de sentido.\nConduzimos uma extensa avaliação de múltiplas incorporações de sentido estático e contextualizado para vários tipos de preconceitos sociais usando as medidas propostas.\nNossos resultados experimentais mostram que, mesmo nos casos em que nenhum viés é encontrado no nível da palavra, ainda existem níveis preocupantes de viés social no nível do sentido, que muitas vezes são ignorados pelas medidas de avaliação do viés no nível da palavra.', 'fr': "Les méthodes d'apprentissage de l'intégration des sens apprennent différentes intégrations pour les différents sens d'un mot ambigu. \nUn sens d'un mot ambigu peut être socialement biaisé alors que les autres sens restent impartiaux. \nPar rapport aux nombreux travaux antérieurs évaluant les biais sociaux dans les intégrations de mots préentraînés, les biais dans les intégrations de sens ont été relativement peu étudiés. \nNous créons un ensemble de données de référence pour évaluer les biais sociaux dans les intégrations de sens et proposons de nouvelles mesures d'évaluation des biais spécifiques au sens. \nNous effectuons une évaluation approfondie de multiples intégrations de sens statiques et contextualisées pour différents types de biais sociaux à l'aide des mesures proposées. \nNos résultats expérimentaux montrent que même dans les cas où aucun biais n'est détecté au niveau des mots, il existe toujours des niveaux inquiétants de biais sociaux au niveau des sens, qui sont souvent ignorés par les mesures d'évaluation des biais au niveau des mots.", 'zh': '感官嵌学为一模棱两可之单词,不同义学为一。 \n一模棱两可之义,或有偏见,而他义持正。 \n与前评预练之词,比于世偏见之事,义销偏见不足。 \n创一准数集,以质义嵌世偏见,并建新特定于感官偏见评事。 \n用所设施各种类型世间偏见者数静情,化官销广评。 \n吾实验结果表明,虽词级无偏差,在官层面犹有可忧之世,而偏见往往为词级所忽。', 'ja': 'センス埋め込み学習法は、曖昧な単語のさまざまな感覚のためにさまざまな埋め込みを学びます。 \n曖昧な言葉の一つの感覚は、社会的に偏っている一方で、他の感覚は偏っていない可能性があります。 \n事前に訓練された単語埋め込みにおける社会的バイアスを評価した多数の以前の研究と比較して、センス埋め込みにおけるバイアスは比較的研究不足である。 \nセンス埋め込みにおける社会的バイアスを評価するためのベンチマークデータセットを作成し、新規のセンス固有のバイアス評価措置を提案します。 \n提案された対策を使用して、さまざまな種類の社会的バイアスのための複数の静的およびコンテキスト化されたセンス埋め込みの広範な評価を行います。 \n我々の実験結果は、単語レベルでバイアスが見つからない場合でも、センスレベルでは依然として心配なレベルの社会的バイアスが存在し、単語レベルのバイアス評価尺度によって無視されることが多いことを示している。', 'hi': 'सेंस एम्बेडिंग सीखने के तरीके एक अस्पष्ट शब्द के विभिन्न इंद्रियों के लिए अलग-अलग एम्बेडिंग सीखते हैं। \nएक अस्पष्ट शब्द का एक अर्थ सामाजिक रूप से पक्षपाती हो सकता है जबकि इसकी अन्य इंद्रियां निष्पक्ष रहती हैं। \nपूर्वप्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग में सामाजिक पूर्वाग्रहों का मूल्यांकन करने वाले कई पूर्व कार्यों की तुलना में, अर्थ एम्बेडिंग में पूर्वाग्रहों को अपेक्षाकृत कम अध्ययन किया गया है। \nहम अर्थ एम्बेडिंग में सामाजिक पूर्वाग्रहों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक बेंचमार्क डेटासेट बनाते हैं और उपन्यास भावना-विशिष्ट पूर्वाग्रह मूल्यांकन उपायों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। \nहम प्रस्तावित उपायों का उपयोग करके विभिन्न प्रकार के सामाजिक पूर्वाग्रहों के लिए कई स्थिर और प्रासंगिक अर्थ एम्बेडिंग का व्यापक मूल्यांकन करते हैं। \nहमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि यहां तक कि उन मामलों में भी जहां शब्द-स्तर पर कोई पूर्वाग्रह नहीं पाया जाता है, अभी भी भावना-स्तर पर सामाजिक पूर्वाग्रहों के चिंताजनक स्तर मौजूद हैं, जिन्हें अक्सर शब्द-स्तर के पूर्वाग्रह मूल्यांकन उपायों द्वारा अनदेखा किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Методы обучения внедрению чувств изучают различные вложения для различных чувств неоднозначного слова. \nОдно из чувств двусмысленного слова может быть социально предвзятым, в то время как другие его чувства остаются непредвзятыми. \nПо сравнению с многочисленными предыдущими работами по оценке социальных предрассудков в предварительно подготовленных вложениях слов, предрассудки в смысловых вложениях были относительно недооценены. \nМы создаем эталонный набор данных для оценки социальных предрассудков в смысловых вложениях и предлагаем новые меры оценки смысловых предрассудков. \nМы проводим обширную оценку множественных статических и контекстуализированных смысловых вложений для различных типов социальных предрассудков с использованием предложенных мер. \nНаши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что даже в тех случаях, когда на уровне слов не обнаруживается никаких предвзятостей, все еще существуют тревожные уровни социальных предрассудков на уровне смысла, которые часто игнорируются мерами оценки предвзятости на уровне слов.', 'ga': 'Foghlaimíonn modhanna foghlama leabú cialla leabú éagsúla do na céadfaí éagsúla d’fhocal débhríoch.\nD’fhéadfadh ciall amháin d’fhocal débhríoch a bheith claonta go sóisialta agus a chéadfaí eile fós neamhchlaonta.\nI gcomparáid leis an iliomad réamhobair a rinne meastóireacht ar na laofachtaí sóisialta i leabú focal réamhoilte, is beag staidéar a rinneadh ar na laofachtaí i leabú ciall.\nCruthaímid tacar sonraí tagarmharcála chun na laofachtaí sóisialta i leabú céadfaí a mheas agus molaimid bearta núíosacha meastóireachta a bhaineann go sonrach le céadfaí.\nDéanaimid meastóireacht fhairsing ar il-leabú céadfaí statach agus comhthéacsaithe do chineálacha éagsúla laofachta sóisialta ag baint úsáide as na bearta atá beartaithe.\nLéiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha, fiú amháin i gcásanna nach bhfaightear aon laofacht ag leibhéal na bhfocal, go bhfuil leibhéil imníoch fós ann de laofachtaí sóisialta ag leibhéal na céadfaí, ar minic nach dtugann na bearta meastóireachta ar laofacht leibhéal na bhfocal neamhaird orthu.', 'ka': 'გაგზავნა სწავლების მეტი განსხვავებული სწავლის განსხვავებული სიტყვის განსხვავებული სიტყვის.', 'hu': 'Az érzékbeágyazási tanulási módszerek különböző beágyazásokat tanulnak egy kétértelmű szó különböző érzékeinek megfelelően.', 'el': 'Οι μέθοδοι μάθησης που ενσωματώνουν την αίσθηση μαθαίνουν διαφορετικές ενσωματώσεις για τις διαφορετικές αισθήσεις μιας διφορούμενης λέξης.', 'it': 'I metodi di apprendimento di incorporazione dei sensi imparano incorporazioni diverse per i diversi sensi di una parola ambigua.', 'kk': 'Оқыту әдістерін жіберу әртүрлі сөздің түрлі сезімдері үшін түрлі ендіру әдістерін үйрену.', 'mk': 'Чувството за вградување на методите на учење научи различни вградувања за различните чувства на двогледен збор.', 'lt': 'Įtraukimo į mokymosi metodus jausmas mokosi skirtingų įtraukimų skirtingoms dviprasmiško žodžio jausmoms.', 'ml': 'Sense embedding learning methods learn different embeddings for the different senses of an ambiguous word.', 'ms': 'Rasakan kaedah pembelajaran memasukkan belajar pembelajaran berbeza untuk perasaan berbeza perkataan yang ambiguh.', 'mn': 'Ингээд суралцах аргыг суралцах нь өөр өөр мэдрэмжүүдийг суралцдаг.', 'no': 'Sender innbygging av læringsmetodar lærer ulike innbygging for dei ulike følelsene av eit avgjengeleg ord.', 'pl': 'Metody nauki osadzania zmysłów uczą się różnych osadzeń dla różnych zmysłów niejednoznacznego słowa.', 'ro': 'Metodele de învățare prin încorporarea simțurilor învăță diferite încorporări pentru diferitele simțuri ale unui cuvânt ambiguu.', 'sr': 'Poslanje ugrađenih metoda učenja nauèi razlièite ugraðenje za razlièite oseæaje nesposobne reèi.', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Sense u diro qalabka waxbarashada ay bartaan qalabka kala duduwan oo ay u bartaan fikrada kala duwan ee hadal qalloocan ah.', 'sv': 'Sense embedding inlärningsmetoder lär sig olika inbäddningar för olika sinnen av ett tvetydigt ord.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தையின் வேறு உணர்வுகளுக்கு மாறுபாடு உள்ள படிக்கும் முறைகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள அனுப்பு', 'ur': 'سیکھنے کے مطابق مطابق پیدا کرنے کے لئے مختلف مطابق پیدا کرنے کے لئے مختلف مطابق پیدا کریں.', 'mt': 'Is-sens ta’ l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ metodi ta’ tagħlim jitgħallem inkorporazzjonijiet differenti għas-sensi differenti ta’ kelma ambigwa.', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự gắn kết cảm xúc với các phương pháp học tập những sự tác hợp khác nhau giữa các giác quan của một từ mơ hồ.', 'bg': 'Методите за вграждане на сетива научават различни вграждания за различните сетива на двусмислена дума.', 'da': 'Sense embedding læringsmetoder lærer forskellige embeddings for de forskellige sanser af et tvetydigt ord.', 'hr': 'Poslanje ugrađenih metoda učenja uči različite ugrađenje za različite osjećaje dvosmislene riječi.', 'nl': 'Sense embedding leermethoden leren verschillende embeddings voor de verschillende zintuigen van een dubbelzinnig woord.', 'de': 'Sense Embedding Lernmethoden lernen verschiedene Einbettungen für die verschiedenen Sinne eines mehrdeutigen Wortes.', 'id': 'Perasaan mempengaruhi metode belajar belajar mempengaruhi yang berbeda untuk perasaan berbeda dari kata yang ambigus.', 'ko': '의미 삽입 학습 방법은 다른 의미의 단어에 대한 서로 다른 의미 학습을 대상으로 서로 다른 삽입을 한다.', 'fa': 'فرستادن روش\u200cهای یادگیری را برای حس\u200cهای مختلف یک کلمه غیرقابل تعلیم می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Sensi zinazoingiza mbinu za kujifunza zinajifunza mazingira tofauti kwa hisia tofauti za neno lisiloeleweka.', 'af': "Stuur ingebde leer metodes leer verskillende inbêdings vir die verskillende senses van 'n onbekende woord.", 'tr': 'Öwrenme metodlaryny görkez üýtgetmek üçin farklı bir söz döwürmeleri öwreniň.', 'sq': 'Ndjehuni duke përfshirë metodat e mësimit mësojnë përfshirje të ndryshme për ndjenjat e ndryshme të një fjale të qartë.', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛 metodlar캼n캼 g칬nd톛r, m칲xt톛lif s칬zl톛rin m칲xt톛lif hissl톛ri 칲칞칲n f톛rqli inbingl톛ri 칬yr톛nir.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন অনুভূতির জন্য বিভিন্ন অনুভূতিতে শিক্ষা শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি শিক্ষা প্রেরণ করুন।', 'am': 'በተለየ ቃላት ለልዩ ልዩ እውቀት የተማሩ ሥርዓቶች ተማሩ፡፡', 'hy': 'Սովորելու մեթոդներ ներգրավելու զգացմունքները տարբեր ներգրավումներ են սովորում անկասկած բառի տարբեր զգացմունքների համար:', 'ca': 'Sense embedding learning methods learn different embeddings for the different senses of an ambiguous word.', 'et': 'Sense manustamise õppemeetodid õpivad erinevaid manustamisi mitmetähendusliku sõna erinevate meelte jaoks.', 'cs': 'Metody vkl찼d찼n챠 smyslu se u훾챠 r킁zn챕 vkl찼d찼n챠 pro r킁zn챕 smysly nejednozna훾n챕ho slova.', 'fi': 'Aistien upottamisen oppimismenetelmät oppivat erilaisia upotuksia moniselitteisen sanan eri aisteille.', 'bs': 'Poslanje ugrađenih metoda učenja uči različite ugrađenje za različite osjećaje nesposobne riječi.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Učne metode vključevanja smisla se naučijo različnih vključitev za različne čute dvoumne besede.', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་པ་ནང་དུ་མཐུད་སྒྲིག་ནང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་མ་འདྲ་བ་གཞན་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་ཡིན་པ', 'he': 'תחושה של שיטות לימוד מוכנות ללמוד שיטות שונות לחושים שונים של מילה סבירה.', 'ha': 'Ka aika da metoden da aka shigar da su a cikin karanta, su sanar da shiryoyin ayuka daban-daban wa sauri masu buƙata.'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'الدلالات الهجينة لتوليد اللغة الطبيعية الموجهة نحو الهدف', 'pt': 'Semântica híbrida para geração de linguagem natural direcionada a objetivos', 'es': 'Semántica híbrida para la generación de lenguaje natural dirigida por objetivos', 'fr': 'Sémantique hybride pour la génération de langage naturel orientée vers les objectifs', 'ja': '目標指向自然言語生成のためのハイブリッドセマンティクス', 'ru': 'Гибридная семантика для генерации естественного языка, ориентированного на цели', 'hi': 'लक्ष्य-निर्देशित प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी के लिए हाइब्रिड शब्दार्थ', 'zh': '导向自然语言生混合语义', 'ga': 'Séimeantaic Hibrideach do Ghiniúint Teanga Nádúrtha atá Dírithe ar Sprioc', 'el': 'Υβριδική Σημασία για τη δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας με στόχο', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Hibrid szemantika a célirányított természetes nyelv generálásához', 'it': 'Semantica ibrida per la generazione del linguaggio naturale diretto agli obiettivi', 'kk': 'Мақсатты тіл жасау үшін гибрид семантикалық', 'mk': 'Хибридна семантика за генерација на природен јазик насочен кон целите', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഗോള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ ജനിപ്പിനുള്ള ഹൈബ്രിഡ് സെമാന്റിക്സ്', 'lt': 'Hibridiniai sementai gamtos kalbų gamybai, kuria siekiama tikslų', 'mt': 'Semantiċi ibridi għall-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwi Naturali Direttati lejn l-Għanijiet', 'mn': 'Цахилгаан байгалийн хэл төрөлхтний гибрид Semantics for Goal-Directed Natural Language Generation', 'pl': 'Semantyka hybrydowa dla generowania języka naturalnego ukierunkowanego na cel', 'no': 'Hybridsemantikk for oppretting av målsretta naturspråk', 'sr': 'Hibridne semantike za generaciju prirodnog jezika na cilju', 'ro': 'Semantică hibridă pentru generarea limbajului natural orientat spre obiective', 'sv': 'Hybridsemantik för målinriktad naturspråksgenerering', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்திற்கான ஹைப்ரிட் செமான்டிக்ஸ்', 'so': 'Hybrid Semantics for Goal-Directed Language Nature', 'ur': 'جال-دئیرسٹ کی طبیعی زبان کی نسل کے لئے ہیبراڈ سیمانٹیکس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Хибридна семантика за целенасочено генериране на естествен език', 'nl': 'Hybride semantica voor doelgerichte natuurlijke taalgeneratie', 'hr': 'Hibridne semantike za generaciju prirodnog jezika na cilju', 'da': 'Hybrid Semantics for målrettet natursproggenerering', 'de': 'Hybride Semantik zur zielgerichteten Generierung natürlicher Sprache', 'id': 'Hybrid Semantics for Goal-Directed Natural Language Generation', 'ko': '목표를 향한 자연 언어 생성의 혼합 의미', 'sw': 'Hybrid Semantics for Goal-Directed Natural Language Generation', 'fa': 'سیمانتیک هایبرید برای نسل زبان طبیعی هدف', 'af': 'Hybrid Semantieke vir Goal- Directed Natuurlike Taal Generasie', 'tr': 'Galak Direktili Dogat Dili Jeşirmek üçin Hybrid Semantikleri', 'sq': 'Semantika hibride për Gjenerimin e Gjuhave Natyrore të Drejtuara për Qëllimin', 'am': 'የHybrid Semantics for Goal-Directed Natural language Generation', 'az': 'Gözəl-yönəlmiş Təbiətli Dil Məxluqatı üçün Hibrid Semantik', 'bn': 'গোল পরিচালিত প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রজন্মের জন্য হাইব্রিড সেমান্টিক', 'hy': 'Hybrid Semantics for Goal-Directed Natural Language Generation', 'bs': 'Hibridne semantike za generaciju prirodnog jezika', 'et': 'Hübriidsemantika eesmärgile suunatud loodusliku keele genereerimiseks', 'cs': 'Hybridní sémantika pro generování cílově orientovaného přirozeného jazyka', 'ca': 'Semàtics híbrids per a la generació de llenguatges naturals dirigits als objectius', 'fi': 'Hybridi semantiikka tavoitteelliseen luonnollisen kielen luomiseen', 'jv': 'HyBridge semanti kanggo Goal-directied Manual Language Generation', 'he': 'סמנטיקה היברידית לייצור שפות טבעיות שמכוונות למטרה', 'sk': 'Hibridna semantika za ciljno usmerjeno ustvarjanje naravnega jezika', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Hybrid Semantics for Goal-Directed Natural Language Generation'}
{'en': 'Prompts for pre-trained language models (PLMs) have shown remarkable performance by bridging the gap between pre-training tasks and various downstream tasks. Among these methods, prompt tuning, which freezes PLMs and only tunes soft prompts, provides an efficient and effective solution for adapting large-scale PLMs to downstream tasks. However, prompt tuning is yet to be fully explored. In our pilot experiments, we find that prompt tuning performs comparably with conventional full-model tuning when downstream data are sufficient, whereas it is much worse under few-shot learning settings, which may hinder the application of prompt tuning. We attribute this low performance to the manner of initializing soft prompts. Therefore, in this work, we propose to pre-train prompts by adding soft prompts into the pre-training stage to obtain a better initialization. We name this Pre-trained Prompt Tuning framework “PPT”. To ensure the generalization of PPT, we formulate similar classification tasks into a unified task form and pre-train soft prompts for this unified task. Extensive experiments show that tuning pre-trained prompts for downstream tasks can reach or even outperform full-model fine-tuning under both full-data and few-shot settings. Our approach is effective and efficient for using large-scale PLMs in practice.', 'fr': "Nous considérons le problème de la génération du langage naturel en fonction d'un objectif communicatif et d'une description du monde. Nous posons la question suivante\xa0: est-il possible de combiner des représentations de sens complémentaires pour mettre à l'échelle un système de GNL orienté vers des objectifs sans perdre en expressivité\xa0? En particulier, nous envisageons d'utiliser deux représentations de signification, l'une basée sur la sémantique logique et l'autre basée sur la sémantique distributionnelle. Nous nous appuyons sur un système de génération axé sur les objectifs, S-STRUCT, qui modélise la génération de phrases comme une planification dans un processus décisionnel de Markov. Nous développons une approche hybride, qui utilise la sémantique distributionnelle pour ajouter rapidement et de manière imprécise les principaux éléments de la phrase, puis utilise une sémantique basée sur la logique de premier ordre pour ajouter plus lentement les détails précis. Nous constatons que notre méthode hybride permet à la génération de S-STRUCT de s'adapter de manière significative aux premières phases de la génération et que l'hybride peut souvent générer des phrases avec la même qualité que S-STRUCT en beaucoup moins de temps. Cependant, nous observons et donnons un aperçu des cas où l'imprécision de la sémantique distributionnelle conduit à une génération qui n'est pas aussi bonne que l'utilisation d'une sémantique logique pure.", 'ja': '私たちは、コミュニケーションの目標と世界の記述を考慮して、自然言語の生成の問題を考慮します。 私たちは、相補的な意味表現を組み合わせて、表現力を失うことなく目標指向NLGシステムを拡張することは可能か？という質問をします。 特に、論理的意味論に基づいたものと、分布的意味論に基づいたものの2つの意味表現を使用することを検討します。 私たちは、既存の目標指向生成システムであるS - STRUCTを構築し、マルコフの意思決定プロセスでの計画として文章生成をモデル化します。 私たちはハイブリッドアプローチを開発し、分布セマンティクスを使用して文の主要な要素を迅速かつ不正確に追加し、次に一階論理ベースのセマンティクスを使用して正確な詳細をよりゆっくりと追加します。 私たちのハイブリッド法は、生成の初期段階でS - STRUCTの生成を大幅に改善することを可能にし、ハイブリッドは多くの場合、S - STRUCTと同じ品質の文章を実質的に短時間で生成することができることを発見しました。 しかし、分布意味論の不正確さが純粋な論理意味論を用いるほどではない生成につながる場合も観察し、洞察を与える。', 'es': 'Consideramos el problema de generar lenguaje natural dado un objetivo comunicativo y una descripción del mundo. Nos hacemos la pregunta: ¿es posible combinar representaciones de significado complementarias para escalar un sistema de NLG orientado a objetivos sin perder expresividad? En particular, consideramos el uso de dos representaciones de significado, una basada en la semántica lógica y la otra basada en la semántica distributiva. Nos basamos en un sistema de generación orientado a objetivos existente, S-STRUCT, que modela la generación de oraciones como planificación en un proceso de decisión de Markov. Desarrollamos un enfoque híbrido, que utiliza la semántica distributiva para agregar de forma rápida e imprecisa los elementos principales de la oración y luego usa la semántica basada en la lógica de primer orden para agregar más lentamente los detalles precisos. Descubrimos que nuestro método híbrido permite que la generación de S-STRUCT se escale significativamente mejor en las primeras fases de la generación y que el híbrido a menudo puede generar oraciones con la misma calidad que S-STRUCT en mucho menos tiempo. Sin embargo, también observamos y damos una idea de los casos en los que la imprecisión en la semántica distributiva conduce a una generación que no es tan buena como usar semántica lógica pura.', 'zh': '吾思给定交际,与世言成自然语言。 问曰:有合互补之义,以广其向NLG统而不失表现力? 特以两种意义为言,一基于逻语义,一基于布语义。 立成系统S-STRUCT上,句建模为马尔可夫计。 开混合之法,其用分布语义速而不精加句之要,然后用基于一阶逻辑之语义,徐加精微。 吾见混合之法,许S-STRUCT生成于早期,而混合之法常可以短长之间,与S-STRUCT同句。 然亦观而察之语义不精确性生不如用纯逻辑语义也。', 'ru': 'Мы рассматриваем проблему генерации естественного языка с учетом коммуникативной цели и описания мира. Мы задаемся вопросом: возможно ли объединить дополнительные смысловые представления для масштабирования ориентированной на цель системы NLG, не теряя при этом выразительности? В частности, мы рассматриваем использование двух смысловых представлений, одно из которых основано на логической семантике, а другое - на дистрибутивной семантике. Мы основываемся на существующей целенаправленной системе генерации S-STRUCT, которая моделирует генерацию предложений как планирование в процессе принятия решений по Маркову. Мы разрабатываем гибридный подход, который использует дистрибутивную семантику для быстрого и неточного добавления основных элементов предложения, а затем использует семантику на основе логики первого порядка для более медленного добавления точных деталей. Мы находим, что наш гибридный метод позволяет поколению S-STRUCT значительно лучше масштабироваться на ранних этапах генерации и что гибрид часто может генерировать предложения с тем же качеством, что и S-STRUCT, за существенно меньшее время. Однако мы также наблюдаем и даем представление о случаях, когда неточность в семантике распределения приводит к генерации, которая не так хороша, как использование чистой логической семантики.', 'ar': 'نحن نعتبر مشكلة توليد لغة طبيعية في ضوء هدف تواصل ووصف عالمي. نطرح السؤال التالي: هل من الممكن الجمع بين تمثيلات المعنى التكميلية لتوسيع نطاق نظام NLG الموجه نحو الهدف دون فقدان التعبير؟ على وجه الخصوص ، نحن نعتبر استخدام تمثيلين معنيين ، أحدهما يعتمد على الدلالات المنطقية والآخر يعتمد على دلالات التوزيع. نحن نبني على نظام الجيل الحالي الموجه بالهدف ، S-STRUCT ، الذي يصمم إنشاء الجملة كتخطيط في عملية اتخاذ قرار ماركوف. نقوم بتطوير نهج هجين ، يستخدم دلالات التوزيع لإضافة العناصر الرئيسية للجملة بسرعة وبشكل غير دقيق ثم استخدام الدلالات المنطقية القائمة على الترتيب الأول لإضافة التفاصيل الدقيقة بشكل أبطأ. وجدنا أن طريقتنا المختلطة تسمح لتوليد S-STRUCT بالتوسع بشكل أفضل في المراحل الأولى من التوليد وأن الهجين يمكنه غالبًا إنشاء جمل بنفس جودة S-STRUCT في وقت أقل بكثير. ومع ذلك ، فإننا نلاحظ أيضًا ونعطي نظرة ثاقبة للحالات التي يؤدي فيها عدم الدقة في دلالات التوزيع إلى توليد ليس بجودة استخدام الدلالات المنطقية البحتة.', 'pt': 'Consideramos o problema de gerar linguagem natural dado um objetivo comunicativo e uma descrição do mundo. Colocamos a questão: é possível combinar representações de significados complementares para dimensionar um sistema de GNL direcionado a objetivos sem perder a expressividade? Em particular, consideramos o uso de duas representações de significado, uma baseada na semântica lógica e outra baseada na semântica distributiva. Construímos a partir de um sistema de geração direcionado a metas existente, S-STRUCT, que modela a geração de sentenças como planejamento em um processo de decisão de Markov. Desenvolvemos uma abordagem híbrida, que usa semântica distributiva para adicionar de forma rápida e imprecisa os principais elementos da frase e, em seguida, usa semântica baseada em lógica de primeira ordem para adicionar mais lentamente os detalhes precisos. Descobrimos que nosso método híbrido permite que a geração do S-STRUCT seja dimensionada significativamente melhor nas fases iniciais da geração e que o híbrido geralmente pode gerar sentenças com a mesma qualidade que o S-STRUCT em substancialmente menos tempo. No entanto, também observamos e fornecemos informações sobre casos em que a imprecisão na semântica distributiva leva a uma geração que não é tão boa quanto usar a semântica lógica pura.', 'hi': 'हम एक संचार लक्ष्य और एक विश्व विवरण को देखते हुए प्राकृतिक भाषा उत्पन्न करने की समस्या पर विचार करते हैं। हम सवाल पूछते हैं: क्या अभिव्यंजकता को खोए बिना लक्ष्य-निर्देशित एनएलजी सिस्टम को स्केल करने के लिए पूरक अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व को संयोजित करना संभव है? विशेष रूप से, हम दो अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्वों का उपयोग करने पर विचार करते हैं, एक तार्किक शब्दार्थ पर आधारित है और दूसरा वितरण ता्मक शब्दार्थ पर आधारित है। हम एक मौजूदा लक्ष्य-निर्देशित पीढ़ी प्रणाली, एस-स्ट्रक्चर पर निर्माण करते हैं, जो मार्कोव निर्णय प्रक्रिया में योजना के रूप में वाक्य पीढ़ी को मॉडल करता है। हम एक हाइब्रिड दृष्टिकोण विकसित करते हैं, जो वाक्य के मुख्य तत्वों को जल्दी और अभेद्य रूप से जोड़ने के लिए वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ का उपयोग करता है और फिर सटीक विवरण ों को धीरे-धीरे जोड़ने के लिए पहले-क्रम के तर्क आधारित शब्दार्थ का उपयोग करता है। हम पाते हैं कि हमारी हाइब्रिड विधि एस-स्ट्रक्चर की पीढ़ी को पीढ़ी के शुरुआती चरणों में काफी बेहतर पैमाने पर स्केल करने की अनुमति देती है और हाइब्रिड अक्सर काफी कम समय में एस-स्ट्रक्चर के समान गुणवत्ता के साथ वाक्य उत्पन्न कर सकती है। हालांकि, हम उन मामलों का भी निरीक्षण करते हैं और अंतर्दृष्टि देते हैं जहां वितरण ता्मक शब्दार्थ में अशुद्धता पीढ़ी की ओर ले जाती है जो शुद्ध तार्किक शब्दार्थ का उपयोग करने के रूप में अच्छी नहीं है।', 'ga': 'Breathnaímid ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le teanga nádúrtha a ghiniúint nuair a thugtar sprioc cumarsáide agus cur síos ar an domhan. Cuirimid an cheist: an féidir léiriúcháin brí chomhlántacha a chur le chéile chun córas NLG atá dírithe ar spriocanna a scála gan an léirthuiscint a chailliúint? Go háirithe, déanaimid machnamh ar dhá léiriú brí a úsáid, ceann amháin bunaithe ar shéimeantaic loighciúil agus an ceann eile bunaithe ar shéimeantaic dáileacháin. Tógaimid ar chóras giniúna spriocdhírithe reatha, S-STRUCT, a mhúnlaíonn giniúint pianbhreithe mar phleanáil i bpróiseas cinnidh Markov. Forbróimid cur chuige hibrideach, a úsáideann séimeantaic dáileacháin chun príomhghnéithe na habairte a shuimiú go tapa agus go neamhchruinn agus ansin úsáideann séimeantaic loighic-bhunaithe den chéad ordú chun na sonraí beachta a chur leis níos moille. Feicimid go gceadaíonn ár modh hibrideach do ghiniúint S-STRUCT scála i bhfad níos fearr i gcéimeanna tosaigh na giniúna agus gur minic gur féidir leis an hibrideach abairtí den cháilíocht chéanna le S-STRUCT a ghiniúint i bhfad níos lú ama. Mar sin féin, breathnaimid freisin agus tugaimid léargas ar chásanna ina mbíonn giniúint nach bhfuil chomh maith le húsáid shéimeantaic loighciúil íon mar thoradh ar an neamhchruinneas sa tséimeantaic dáileacháin.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ პრობლემა, რომელიც სახური ენის შექმნა, რომელიც კომუნიკაციური მიზეზი და მსოფლიოს გამოსახულება. ჩვენ კითხვის შესაძლებელია: შესაძლებელია კომპლენტერიური ნიშნალის გამოყენება, რომ მიზეზი NLG სისტემის გაზომილებას, გამოყენება არ გამოიყენება? განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ გამოყენება ორი ნიშნავულების გამოყენება, ერთი ლოგიკური სმენტიკების და მეორე განსაკუთრებული სმენტიკების გამოყენება. ჩვენ მიმდინარე მიზეზების მიზეზების მიზეზების სისტემაზე, S-STRUCT, რომელიც მიზეზების მოდელების შექმნა, რომელიც მარკოვას მიზეზების პროცესის პროცე ჩვენ განვითარებთ ჰიბრიტური პროგრამა, რომელიც გამოყენებს განსაზღვრებული სემენტიკების გასაკუთრებლად და უკეთესი გასაკუთრებლად სიმპანტიკების გასაკუთრებლად და შემდეგ პირველი პროგრამა ლოგიკ ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ ჩვენი ჰიბრიდი მეთოდი შეუძლია S-STRUCT წარმოდგენის უფრო უფრო უკეთესი წარმოდგენის ფეზაში და რომ ჰიბრიდი ძალიან შეუძლია გავიქმნა წარმოდგენები, როგორც S-STRUCT-ს მაგრამ, ჩვენ ასევე დავხედავთ და გავაკეთებთ შემთხვევაში, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებული სემენტიკების შესახებ, რომელიც არ არის მსგავსი ლოგიკური სემენტიკების გამოყენება.', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelv létrehozásának problémáját kommunikációs céllal és világmutatással tekintjük. Felteszük a kérdést: lehetséges-e kombinálni a kiegészítő jelentésreformációkat egy célirányú NLG rendszer méretezésére anélkül, hogy elveszítené az expresszivitást? Különösen fontolóra vesszük két jelentési reprezentációt, az egyik logikai szemantikán alapul, a másik pedig disztribúciós szemantikán alapul. Egy meglévő célirányú generációs rendszerre, az S-STRUCT-re építünk, amely a Markov döntési folyamatában a mondatok generációját modellezi. Hibrid megközelítést dolgozunk ki, amely elosztási szemantikát használ a mondat fő elemeinek gyors és pontatlan hozzáadására, majd elsőrendű logikai alapú szemantikát használ a pontos részletek lassabb hozzáadására. Megállapítjuk, hogy hibrid módszerünk lehetővé teszi az S-STRUCT generációja számára, hogy a generáció korai szakaszaiban jelentősen jobban skálázzon, és hogy a hibrid gyakran képes ugyanolyan minőségű mondatokat generálni, mint az S-STRUCT lényegesen kevesebb idő alatt. Megfigyeljük azonban és betekintést nyújtunk azokba az esetekbe is, amikor a disztribúciós szemantika pontatlansága olyan generációhoz vezet, amely nem olyan jó, mint a tiszta logikai szemantika használata.', 'el': 'Θεωρούμε το πρόβλημα της δημιουργίας φυσικής γλώσσας δεδομένο ενός επικοινωνιακού στόχου και μιας παγκόσμιας περιγραφής. Θέτουμε το ερώτημα: είναι δυνατόν να συνδυάσουμε συμπληρωματικές αναπαραστάσεις εννοιών για να κλιμακώσουμε ένα στοχοθετημένο σύστημα χωρίς να χάσουμε την εκφραστικότητα; Ειδικότερα, εξετάζουμε τη χρήση δύο συμβολικών αναπαραστάσεων, η μία βασισμένη στη λογική σημασιολογία και η άλλη βασισμένη στη διανεμητική σημασιολογία. Βασιζόμαστε σε ένα υπάρχον σύστημα παραγωγής με στόχο, το οποίο μοντελοποιεί την παραγωγή προτάσεων ως προγραμματισμό σε μια διαδικασία απόφασης Μάρκοφ. Αναπτύσσουμε μια υβριδική προσέγγιση, η οποία χρησιμοποιεί τη σημασιολογία κατανομής για να προσθέσει γρήγορα και ανακριβώς τα κύρια στοιχεία της πρότασης και στη συνέχεια χρησιμοποιεί σημασιολογία πρώτης τάξης για να προσθέσει πιο αργά τις ακριβείς λεπτομέρειες. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η υβριδική μας μέθοδος επιτρέπει στην παραγωγή της να κλιμακώνεται σημαντικά καλύτερα σε πρώιμες φάσεις της παραγωγής και ότι το υβριδικό μπορεί συχνά να δημιουργήσει προτάσεις με την ίδια ποιότητα με το σε σημαντικά μικρότερο χρόνο. Ωστόσο, παρατηρούμε και δίνουμε διορατικότητα σε περιπτώσεις όπου η ασάφεια στη σημασιολογία κατανομής οδηγεί σε δημιουργία που δεν είναι τόσο καλή όσο η χρήση καθαρής λογικής σημασιολογίας.', 'lt': 'We consider the problem of generating natural language given a communicative goal and a world description.  Klausime klausimą: ar įmanoma derinti papildomas reikšmingas atstovavimas, kad būtų galima plėtoti tiksliniu tikslu orientuotą NLG sistemą neprarasdami aiškios reikšmės? Visų pirma svarstome, kaip naudoti dvi reikšmingas atstovavimas, vienas pagrįstas logine semantika, o kitas pagrįstas platinimo semantika. We build upon an existing goal-directed generation system, S-STRUCT, which models sentence generation as planning in a Markov decision process.  Kuriame hibridinį požiūrį, kuris naudoja paskirstymo semantiką, kad greitai ir netiksliai pridėtume pagrindinius sakinio elementus, o vėliau naudojame pirmosios eilės logiškai pagrįstą semantiką, kad lėčiau pridėtume tikslią informaciją. Matome, kad mūs ų hibridinis metodas leidžia S-STRUCT kartai gerokai geriau mastuoti ankstyvuoju gamybos etapu ir kad hibridinis metodas dažnai gali sukelti tokią pačią kokybę kaip S-STRUCT per gerokai mažiau laiko. Vis dėlto mes taip pat stebime ir suprantame atvejus, kai netikslumas platinimo semantikoje sukuria kartą, kuri nėra tokia gera kaip naudojant gryną logišką semantiką.', 'mk': 'Го сметаме проблемот со генерирање природен јазик со комуникациска цел и светски опис. Го поставуваме прашањето: дали е можно да се комбинираат комплементарни претставувања со значење за да се скалира цел-насочен НЛГ систем без да се изгуби експресивноста? Особено, размислуваме за користење на две значење претставувања, една базирана на логична семантика и другата базирана на дистрибуционална семантика. Ние изградуваме на постојан систем на генерација насочен кон цели, С-СТРУКТ, кој моделира генерација на реченици како планирање во процесот на одлука на Марков. Развиваме хибриден пристап, кој користи дистрибуционална семантика за брзо и непрецизно да ги додаде главните елементи на реченицата и потоа користи семантика базирана на логика од прв ред за полека да ги додаде прецизните детали. Најдовме дека нашиот хибриден метод овозможува генерацијата на S-STRUCT значително подобро да се скалира во раните фази на генерацијата и дека хибридот честопати може да генерира реченици со ист квалитет како S-STRUCT во значително помалку време. Сепак, ние исто така набљудуваме и даваме информации за случаите во кои непрецизноста во дистрибуционалната семантика води до генерација која не е толку добра како користењето чиста логична семантика.', 'it': "Consideriamo il problema della generazione del linguaggio naturale dato un obiettivo comunicativo e una descrizione del mondo. Ci poniamo la domanda: è possibile combinare rappresentazioni complementari di significato per scalare un sistema NLG orientato agli obiettivi senza perdere espressività? In particolare, consideriamo l'utilizzo di due rappresentazioni di significato, una basata sulla semantica logica e l'altra basata sulla semantica distributiva. Costruiamo su un sistema di generazione orientato agli obiettivi esistente, S-STRUCT, che modella la generazione di frasi come pianificazione in un processo decisionale Markov. Sviluppiamo un approccio ibrido, che utilizza la semantica distributiva per aggiungere rapidamente e imprecisamente gli elementi principali della frase e poi utilizza la semantica basata sulla logica di primo ordine per aggiungere più lentamente i dettagli precisi. Troviamo che il nostro metodo ibrido consente alla generazione di S-STRUCT di scalare significativamente meglio nelle prime fasi della generazione e che l'ibrido può spesso generare frasi con la stessa qualità di S-STRUCT in tempi notevolmente inferiori. Tuttavia, osserviamo e diamo una visione dei casi in cui l'imprecisione nella semantica distributiva porta a una generazione che non è buona come l'uso della semantica logica pura.", 'kk': 'Біз табиғи тілді жасау мәселесін қарастырмыз. Қосымша мақсатты және әлемнің сипаттамасы. Біз сұрақ береміз: мақсатты NLG жүйесінің көтерілігін жоғалтып, қосымша мәліметтерді біріктіру мүмкін пе? Біз осындай-ақ, бір логикалық семантикалық және бір-бірінің тарату семантикалық тәсілдеріне негізделген екі мазмұнын қолдану үшін ойлаймыз. Біз бар мақсатты жасау жүйесіне S-STRUCT құрамыз. Марков шешім процесінде үлгілерді жасау үлгілерін жасау үшін. Біз гибридтік тәртібін құрамыз. Бұл үлестіріміздің негізгі элементтерін жылдам және дұрыс емес ретінде қосу үшін үлестіріміздің семантикасын қолданады. Содан кейін алғашқы ретінде логикалық негізгі Біз гибрид әдіміміздің S-STRUCT құрылғысының басындағы кезекте жақсы масштабтау мүмкіндігін түсіндіреді және гибрид S-STRUCT сапасы менен бірдей сапатты сөйлемелерді көбірек кезде жақсы масштабтау мүмкінд Бірақ біз де бөлімдеу семантикалық тәртіпсіздіктерді қалай жақсы тәртіпсіздік семантикалық симантикалық қолданудың жақсы емес жағдайды қарап көреміз.', 'ms': 'We consider the problem of generating natural language given a communicative goal and a world description.  Kami bertanya soalan: adakah ia mungkin untuk menggabungkan perwakilan makna kumplimentar untuk skala sistem NLG bertujuan tujuan tanpa kehilangan ekspresif? Secara khususnya, kita mempertimbangkan menggunakan dua perwakilan bermakna, satu berdasarkan semantik logik dan yang lain berdasarkan semantik distribusi. Kami membangun pada sistem generasi yang ada, S-STRUCT, yang mana model generasi kalimat sebagai rancangan dalam proses keputusan Markov. Kami mengembangkan pendekatan hibrid, yang menggunakan semantik distribusi untuk dengan cepat dan tidak tepat menambah unsur utama kalimat dan kemudian menggunakan semantik berdasarkan logik tertib pertama untuk lebih perlahan menambah perincian yang tepat. Kami mendapati bahawa kaedah hibrid kami membenarkan generasi S-STRUCT untuk skala lebih baik dalam tahap awal generasi dan bahawa hibrid sering boleh menghasilkan kalimat dengan kualiti yang sama dengan S-STRUCT dalam masa yang jauh kurang. Namun, kita juga mengamati dan memberikan pandangan pada kes-kes di mana ketidaktepatan dalam semantik distribusi membawa kepada generasi yang tidak sebaik menggunakan semantik logik murni.', 'mt': 'Aħna nqisu l-problem a tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwa naturali minħabba għan komunikattiv u deskrizzjoni dinjija. Aħna nistaqsu l-mistoqsija: huwa possibbli li jiġu kkombinati rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ tifsira kumplimentari biex tiġi skalata sistema NLG immirata lejn l-għanijiet mingħajr ma tintilef l-espressività? B’mod partikolari, qed nikkunsidraw l-użu ta’ żewġ rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ tifsira, waħda bbażata fuq semantika loġika u l-oħra bbażata fuq semantika distributtiva. Aħna nibnu fuq sistema eżistenti ta’ ġenerazzjoni mmirata lejn l-għanijiet, S-STRUCT, li timmudella l-ġenerazzjoni tas-sentenzi bħala ppjanar fi proċess ta’ deċiżjoni Markov. Aħna niżviluppaw approċċ ibridu, li juża semantika distributtiva biex iżidu malajr u b’mod impreċiż l-elementi ewlenin tas-sentenza u mbagħad jużaw semantika bbażata fuq loġika tal-ewwel ordni biex iżżidu d-dettalji preċiżi aktar bil-mod. Aħna nsibu li l-metodu ibridu tagħna jippermetti li l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ S-STRUCT tiżdied b’mod sinifikanti aħjar fil-fażijiet bikrija tal-ġenerazzjoni u li l-ibridu ħafna drabi jista’ jiġġenera sentenzi bl-istess kwalità bħal S-STRUCT fi żmien sostanzjalment inqas. Madankollu, aħna nħarsu u nħarsu wkoll lejn każijiet fejn l-impreċiżjoni fis-semantika distributtiva twassal għal ġenerazzjoni li mhijiex tajba daqs l-użu ta’ semantika pura loġika.', 'pl': 'Rozważamy problem generowania języka naturalnego pod kątem celu komunikacyjnego i opisu świata. Zadajemy pytanie: czy możliwe jest połączenie uzupełniających się reprezentacji znaczenia w celu skalowania ukierunkowanego na cel systemu NLG bez utraty ekspresji? W szczególności rozważamy zastosowanie dwóch reprezentacji znaczenia, jednej opartej na semantyce logicznej i drugiej opartej na semantyce dystrybucyjnej. Opieramy się na istniejącym systemie generowania ukierunkowanym na cel, S-STRUCT, który modeluje generowanie zdań jako planowanie w procesie decyzji Markova. Opracowujemy podejście hybrydowe, które wykorzystuje semantykę dystrybucyjną do szybkiego i nieprecyzyjnego dodawania głównych elementów zdania, a następnie wykorzystuje semantykę opartą na logice pierwszego rzędu, aby powoli dodawać precyzyjne szczegóły. Stwierdzimy, że nasza metoda hybrydowa pozwala generować S-STRUCT znacznie lepiej skalować się we wczesnych fazach generacji i że hybryda często może generować zdania o tej samej jakości co S-STRUCT w znacznie krótszym czasie. Obserwujemy jednak i dajemy wgląd w przypadki, w których niedokładność semantyki dystrybucyjnej prowadzi do generowania, które nie jest tak dobre jak stosowanie czystej semantyki logicznej.', 'mn': 'Бид байгалийн хэл боловсруулах асуудлыг харилцааны зорилго болон дэлхийн тайлбар өгсөн. Бид асуултыг асууж байна: Цагаан дахь НLG системийг илэрхийллийг алдаггүй нэмэлт утгыг нийлүүлэх боломжтой уу? Ялангуяа бид хоёр утгатай илэрхийллийг ашиглаж, нэгийг логикийн semantics дээр, нөгөө нь хуваарилцааны semantics дээр суурилсан. Бид Марков шийдвэр гаргах процесс дээр шийдвэр гаргах зорилго руу зориулсан үеийн систем дээр, S-STRUCT-г бий болгож байна. Бид хуваарилалтын семантикийг хурдан, шууд хэмжээний гол элементүүдийг нэмэхэд эхний дараа логикийн үндсэн семантикийг илүү удаан нэмэхэд ашигладаг. Бид хүмүүсийн гибрид арга нь S-STRUCT-ын үеийн эхний үеийн үеэр илүү сайн хэмжээний боломж олгодог бөгөөд гибрид нь S-STRUCT-тай ижил чанартай үеийг ихэвчлэн бага хугацаанд гаргаж чадна. Гэхдээ бид мөн хуваарилцааны семантикийн буруу зүйлсийг цэвэрхэн логикийн семантикийг ашиглаж чадахгүй үеийнх хүмүүст анзаарч, ойлголт өгдөг.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നം നമ്മള്\u200d വിചാരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ നമ്മള്\u200d ചോദ്യം ചോദിക്കുന്നു: പ്രസ്താവം നഷ്ടപ്പെടാതെ ഒരു ലക്ഷ്യം നേരിട്ട NLG സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികളെ കൂട്ട പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, രണ്ടു അര്\u200dത്ഥം പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, ഒന്ന് ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലാണ്, മറ്റേത നിലവിലുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലുള്ള തലമുറയുടെ സിസ്റ്റം, S-സ്റ്റ്രൂസിറ്റ് നാം പണിയുന്നു. അത് ഒരു മാര്\u200dക്കോവിന്റെ ത വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രധാന മൂലകങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d വേഗം വിതരണ സെമാന്റിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ് നടപടി നാം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. പിന്ന ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഹൈബ്രിഡ് രീതിയില്\u200d S-സ്റ്റ്രൂക്ടിന്റെ തലമുറകള്\u200dക്ക് വളരെ നല്ല തരത്തില്\u200d മാറ്റാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. തലമുറതലമുറയില്\u200d ഹൈബ് എങ്കിലും നമ്മള്\u200d കേസുകളില്\u200d നോക്കുകയും കാണുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. വിഭാഗിക്കുന്ന സെമാന്റിക്കിലെ പ്രശ്നമില്ലാത്ത തലമുറകളിലേ', 'no': 'Vi ser på problemet med å laga naturspråk gitt ei kommunikasjonskmål og ei verdsbeskrivelse. Vi spør spørsmålet: Er det mogleg å kombinere komplementære meningsrepresentasjonar for å skalera eit målrett NLG-system utan å mista uttrykk? I særskilt ser vi på å bruka to meningsrepresentasjonar, ein basert på logiske semantikk og den andre basert på distribusjonske semantikk. Vi bygger på eit eksisterande målsettingssystem, S-STRUCT, som modeller setningar som planlegging i eit Markov-beslutningsprosess. Vi utviklar ein hybridtilnærming, som brukar distribusjonssemantikk for raskt og uverksam å leggja til hovudelementa i setningen, og så brukar førstrekkefølgje logiske baserte semantikk for å leggja til raskt detaljar. Vi finn at vårt hybridmetode lèt generasjonen av S-STRUCT skalera betydelig bedre i tidlegare genereringsfasar og at hybriden ofte kan generera setningar med same kvalitet som S-STRUCT i betydelig mindre tid. I tillegg kan vi også observere og gje innsyning i tilfeller der imprecision i distribusjonssemantikk fører til generasjon som ikkje er så godt som bruk rein logisk semantikk.', 'si': 'අපි හිතන්නේ ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව නිර්මාණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සම්බන්ධ අරමුණක් සහ ලෝක විස්තර අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය අහනවා: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති විදිහට අරමුණු NLG පද්ධතියක් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්ද? විශේෂයෙන්, අපි හිතන්නේ අදහස් දෙකක් විශ්වාස කරන්න, එකක් ලෝකික සෙමැන්ටික් සහ අනිත් විශේෂ සෙමැන්ටි අපි තියෙන්නේ ඉලක්කම් ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියක්, S-STRUCT, මාර්කෝව් තීරණ පද්ධතියේ සැලසුම් වෙනුවෙන් වාර්තාව ප අපි හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනය සෙමැන්ටික්ස් විදිහට ඉක්මනින් සහ අවස්ථාවක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරධාන අයි අපි හොයාගන්නවා අපේ හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විධානය S-STRUCT ගේ පරිමාණයට විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන නමුත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සහ පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙනවා කොහොමද විතරයෙන් විතරයෙන් විතරයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයකට පිළ', 'ro': 'Considerăm problema generarii limbajului natural dată un scop comunicativ și o descriere a lumii. Ne punem întrebarea: este posibil să combinăm reprezentări complementare de semnificații pentru a extinde un sistem NLG orientat spre obiective fără a pierde expresivitatea? În special, considerăm utilizarea a două reprezentări de semnificație, una bazată pe semantica logică și cealaltă bazată pe semantica distribuțională. Construim pe un sistem de generare orientat spre obiective existent, S-STRUCT, care modelează generarea sentințelor ca planificare într-un proces decizional Markov. Dezvoltăm o abordare hibridă, care folosește semantica distribuțională pentru a adăuga rapid și imprecis elementele principale ale propoziției și apoi folosește semantica bazată pe logica de prim ordin pentru a adăuga mai lent detaliile precise. Considerăm că metoda noastră hibridă permite generației S-STRUCT să se scaleze semnificativ mai bine în fazele incipiente ale generației și că hibridul poate genera adesea propoziții cu aceeași calitate ca S-STRUCT în mult mai puțin timp. Cu toate acestea, observăm și oferim o perspectivă asupra cazurilor în care imprecisia în semantica distribuțională duce la generație care nu este la fel de bună ca utilizarea semanticii logice pure.', 'sv': 'Vi betraktar problemet med att skapa naturligt språk med ett kommunikativt mål och en världsbeskrivning. Vi ställer oss frågan: är det möjligt att kombinera kompletterande betydelserepresentationer för att skala ett målinriktat NLG-system utan att förlora uttrycksfullheten? I synnerhet överväger vi att använda två betydelserepresentationer, en baserad på logisk semantik och den andra baserad på distributionssig semantik. Vi bygger vidare på ett befintligt målinriktat generationssystem, S-STRUCT, som modellerar meningsgenerering som planering i en Markovs beslutsprocess. Vi utvecklar en hybrid strategi, som använder distributionsemantik för att snabbt och oklart lägga till huvudelementen i meningen och sedan använder första ordningens logikbaserad semantik för att långsammare lägga till de exakta detaljerna. Vi finner att vår hybridmetod gör det möjligt för S-STRUCT:s generation att skala betydligt bättre i tidiga generationsfaser och att hybriden ofta kan generera meningar med samma kvalitet som S-STRUCT på betydligt kortare tid. Men vi observerar och ger insikt i fall där osäkerheten i distributionsemantiken leder till generationer som inte är lika bra som att använda ren logisk semantik.', 'ur': 'ہم نے طبیعی زبان کی پیدائش کی مشکل کو سمجھ لیا ہے کہ ایک رابطہ دار مقصد اور ایک دنیا کی توصیف ہے ہم سؤال پوچھتے ہیں: کیا اضافہ کی معنی کی تعلیمات کو جمع کرنا امکان ہے کہ ایک مقصد کی NLG سیستم کو مضبوطی کے بغیر خسارہ نہ ہو؟ مخصوصاً ہم نے دو معنی نمونات کا استعمال کیا ہے، ایک منطقی سیمانٹیکوں پر اور دوسرے کو تقسیم سیمانٹیکوں پر بنیاد رکھا ہے. ہم ایک موجود موجود مقصد کی نسل سیسٹم پر بناتے ہیں، S-STRUCT، جس نے مجلس کی نسل کو مارکوف کے فیصلہ پروسس میں تدبیر کی طرح تدبیر کیا ہے. ہم ایک ہیبریڈ طریقہ کی تخلیق کریں گے، جسے سریع اور غلط طریقہ کے لئے تقسیم سیمانٹیکوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے، اور اس کے بعد پہلی اوردن لاجیک بنیاد سیمانٹیکوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ دقیق جزئیات میں زیادہ اضافہ کریں۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ہمارا ہیبراڈ طریقہ S-STRUCT کی نسل کی نسل کی نسل سے زیادہ اچھی طریقے سے استعمال کرتا ہے اور یہ کہ ہیبراڈ اکثر ایسی کیفیت سے S-STRUCT کی نسل کو زیادہ کم زمانہ میں فصل پیدا کر سکتا ہے۔ لیکن ہم نے بھی دیکھ لیا اور دیکھ لیا ہے جہاں تقسیم سیمانٹیکوں میں غلطی کی نسل کی طرف چلتی ہے جو پاکیزہ منطقی سیمانٹیکوں کے استعمال سے بہتر نہیں ہے۔', 'so': "Waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa dhibaatada abuuridda luqada dabiicadda ah oo la siiyo goal xiriir iyo tilmaamo adduunka. Soo waydiinaa: ma suurtowdaa in la isku xiriiro noocyada macnaheedu ay leedahay in lagu qiyaaso nidaamka hagaajinta NLG iyadoon lumin muuqashada? Si gaar ah, waxaynu ka fikiraanaa isticmaalka laba nooc oo micneheeda ah, mid ku saleysan luqada jimicsiga iyo kan kalena ku saleysan qeybinta. Waxaynu ku dhisaynaa nidaam la hagayo oo ku qoran karo qorshaha go'aanka Markov. Waxaynu horumarinaa hab-dhaqsi ah, taasoo u isticmaalaya qayb-qaybinta si dhaqso ah uguna kordhiya qeybaha ugu hooseeya ee ereyga, kadibna waxaynu isticmaalnaa qalabka habaarka ee hore si dhaqso ah ugu sii daraa faa'iidada saxda ah. Waxaynu helnaa in qaababkayaga hybrid uu u ogolaan karo qarniga S-STRUCT inay si aad u fiican u qiyaasto xafiisyada bilowga iyo in xilliga hore xiliga dhaqdhaqaalaha hiwaayadu ay marar badan u soo saari karaan xukun isku mid ah oo S-STRUCT xilli ka yar. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaynu fiirinaynaa islamarkaasna waxaynu fiirinaynaa xaaladaha ku saabsan kalajada kala gedisan, taasoo ay ku leedahay farshaxan aan u wanaagsanayn sida isticmaalka saqliga ah.", 'ta': 'We consider the problem of generating natural language given a communicative goal and a world description.  நாம் கேள்வியை கேட்கிறோம்: காட்சியை இழக்காமல் சிக்கலான அர்த்தம் குறிப்புகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்க முடியுமா? குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் இரண்டு அர்த்தமான குறிப்பிடுகளை பயன்படுத்தி கருதுகிறோம், ஒரு தொழில்நுட்பம் பெம்மான்டிக்கள நாங்கள் இருக்கும் இலக்கு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட தலைப்பு அமைப்பின் மீது கட்டுகிறோம், S-STRUCT, அது மார்க்கோவ் தீர்ப்பு  நாம் ஒரு ஹைப்ரிட் செயலை உருவாக்குகிறோம், அது விரைவில் பங்கீட்டு அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி வாக்கியத்தின் முக்கிய உறுப்புகளை சேர்க்கும் பிறகு  எங்கள் ஹைப்ரிட் முறைமையில் S-STRUCT தலைமுறையின் தலைமுறையில் மிகவும் சிறப்பாக அளவிட அனுமதிக்கிறது என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் ஹைப்ரிட் பெரும ஆயினும், நாம் பார்க்க மற்றும் பார்க்க வேண்டும் நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு உணர்வு கொடுக்கிறோம் பங்கீட்டு பெம்மென்டிக்கு எதி', 'sr': 'Smatramo problem stvaranja prirodnog jezika s obzirom na komunikatni cilj i opis svijeta. Postavljamo pitanje: da li je moguće kombinirati komplementarno značenje predstavljanja za skalu ciljevskog sistema NLG bez gubitka izrazitosti? Posebno, razmišljamo o korištenju dva značaja, jedne zasnovane na logičkoj semantici i druge zasnovane na distribucijskoj semantici. Mi izgradimo na postojećem sistemu generacije cilja, S-STRUCT, koji modeli generaciju rečenice kao planiranje u procesu odluke Markov a. Razvijamo hibridni pristup, koji koristi distribucijsku semantiku da brzo i nepravedno dodaju glavne elemente rečenice, a onda koristimo semantike na osnovu prvog reda logike da sporije dodaju precizne detalje. Naša hibridna metoda omogućava generaciji S-STRUCT da se značajno bolje skala u ranim fazama generacije i da hibrid može često stvoriti rečenice sa istom kvalitetom kao S-STRUCT u značajno manje vremena. Međutim, mi takođe posmatramo i pružamo uvid u slučajevima u kojima neprecesija u distribucijskoj semantici vodi do generacije koja nije toliko dobra kao upotreba čiste logičke semantike.', 'uz': "Biz tabiiy tilni yaratish muammolarini o'ylaymiz, ma'lumot maqola va dunyo taʼminotini anglatadi. Biz savol so'raymiz: tashkilotni tasdiqlash imkoniyatini birlashtirish mumkin? Ko'rsatganda, biz ikki ma'nosi tashkilotni ishlatishni tasavvur qilamiz, biri logical semantika asosida va boshqa tarqatish semantika asosida asoslangan. Biz mavjud maqola boshqaruv tizimi S-STRUCT (S-STRUCT) bilan quyimiz. Bu bir so'zlar yaratuvchisi Markov o'zgarish jarayonini boshqarishga qaramadi. Biz hybrid usulini tahlil qilamiz, bu soʻzning asosiy elementlarini tez qo'shish va keyin birinchi tarkibi logika asosida semantika qo'shish uchun tez taqlikni tezlashtirish uchun foydalanamiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, bizning hybrid usuli S-STRUCT авлиё ҳозир ҳозирги замонларда juda yaxshi ko'paytirish imkoniyatini beradi, va hybrid ko'p paytda SSTRUCT kabi bir xil paytida o'xshash so'zlarni yaratishi mumkin. Шунингдек, биз ҳам кўриб турамиз ва тушуниб турамиз, унда таркибида семинтиклар мавжудотларида қизиқлик кўриниб чиқиши мумкин, бунга тойиқ logical semantika фойдаланиши мумкин эмас.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xem xét vấn đề phát triển ngôn ngữ tự nhiên với mục đích giao tiếp và mô tả thế giới. Chúng tôi đặt câu hỏi: có thể kết hợp các diễn văn có ý nghĩa bổ sung để mô phỏng một hệ thống định hướng không làm mất biểu cảm không? Chúng tôi nghĩ ta nên dùng hai biểu tượng có ý nghĩa, một theo ngữ nghĩa logic và một theo ngữ pháp phân phối. Chúng ta xây dựng một hệ thống sản xuất đích của hiện tại, S-STRUT, mô tả việc sản xuất từ án để lên kế hoạch trong quá trình quyết định Markov. Chúng ta phát triển một phương pháp lai hợp, nó dùng ngữ pháp phân phối để trộn nhanh gọn và vội vã thêm các yếu tố chủ yếu của câu đó và sau đó dùng khái niệm logic thứ nhất để thêm các chi tiết chính xác vào chậm hơn. Chúng tôi thấy rằng phương pháp hỗn hợp của chúng tôi cho phép thế hệ S-STUCT có khả năng leo thang tốt hơn nhiều trong giai đoạn đầu của thế hệ, và rằng người lai thường có thể tạo ra câu với chất lượng giống như S-STUCT trong thời gian ít nhiều. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi cũng quan sát và soi sáng các trường hợp thiếu suy đoán về ngữ pháp phân phối dẫn đến một thế hệ không tốt như sử dụng ngữ pháp thuần khiết.', 'da': "Vi betragter problemet med at generere naturligt sprog givet et kommunikativt mål og en verdensbeskrivelse. Vi stiller spørgsmålet: Er det muligt at kombinere komplementære meningsrepræsentationer for at skalere et målrettet NLG-system uden at miste udtryksevnen? Vi overvejer især at bruge to betydningsrepræsentationer, den ene baseret på logisk semantik og den anden baseret på distributionsmæssig semantik. Vi bygger videre på et eksisterende målrettet generationssystem, S-STRUCT, som modellerer sætningsgenerering som planlægning i en Markov beslutningsproces. Vi udvikler en hybrid tilgang, der bruger distributions semantik til hurtigt og upræcist at tilføje de vigtigste elementer i sætningen og derefter bruger førsteordens logik baseret semantik til langsommere at tilføje de præcise detaljer. Vi finder ud af, at vores hybridmetode gør det muligt for S-STRUCT's generation at skalere betydeligt bedre i de tidlige generationsfaser, og at hybriden ofte kan generere sætninger med samme kvalitet som S-STRUCT på betydeligt mindre tid. Men vi observerer og giver også indblik i tilfælde, hvor upræcisheden i distributionsemantikken fører til generation, der ikke er så god som at bruge ren logisk semantik.", 'bg': 'Ние разглеждаме проблема с генерирането на естествен език като комуникативна цел и световно описание. Задаваме въпроса: възможно ли е да се комбинират допълващи се символи за мащабиране на целенасочена система от НЛГ, без да се губи изразителността? По-специално, разглеждаме използването на две смислени представи, едната базирана на логическа семантика и другата базирана на дистрибуционна семантика. Надграждаме съществуваща целенасочена система за генериране, която моделира генерирането на изречения като планиране в процеса на вземане на решение на Марков. Разработваме хибриден подход, който използва дистрибуционна семантика, за да добави бързо и неточно основните елементи на изречението и след това използва семантика от първи ред, базирана на логика, за да добави по-бавно точните детайли. Откриваме, че хибридният ни метод позволява генерирането на С-СТРУКТ да се мащабира значително по-добре в ранните фази на генериране и че хибридът често може да генерира изречения със същото качество като С-СТРУКТ за значително по-малко време. Въпреки това, ние също наблюдаваме и даваме представа за случаите, когато неточността в дистрибуционната семантика води до генериране, което не е толкова добро, колкото използването на чиста логическа семантика.', 'nl': 'We beschouwen het probleem van het genereren van natuurlijke taal als een communicatief doel en een wereldbeschrijving. We stellen de vraag: is het mogelijk om complementaire betekenisrepresentaties te combineren om een doelgericht NLG-systeem te schalen zonder de expressiviteit te verliezen? In het bijzonder overwegen we twee betekenisrepresentaties te gebruiken, een gebaseerd op logische semantiek en de andere gebaseerd op distributiesemantiek. We bouwen voort op een bestaand doelgericht generatiesysteem, S-STRUCT, dat zinnengenering modelleert als planning in een Markov beslissingsproces. We ontwikkelen een hybride benadering, die gebruikmaakt van distributionele semantiek om snel en onnauwkeurig de belangrijkste elementen van de zin toe te voegen en vervolgens gebruik maakt van eerste orde logica gebaseerde semantiek om langzamer de precieze details toe te voegen. We merken dat onze hybride methode de generatie van S-STRUCT aanzienlijk beter laat schalen in vroege generatiefasen en dat de hybride vaak zinnen kan genereren met dezelfde kwaliteit als S-STRUCT in aanzienlijk minder tijd. We observeren en geven inzicht in gevallen waarin de onnauwkeurigheid in distributionele semantiek leidt tot een generatie die niet zo goed is als het gebruik van pure logische semantiek.', 'hr': 'Smatramo problem stvaranja prirodnog jezika s obzirom na komunikacijski cilj i opis svijeta. Postavljamo pitanje: je li moguće kombinirati komplementarno značenje za mjerenje ciljevnog sustava NLG bez gubitka izrazitosti? Posebno, razmišljamo o korištenju dva značaja predstavljanja, jedna zasnovana na logičkoj semantici i druga zasnovana na distribucijskom semantiku. Mi izgradimo na postojećem sustavu generacije cilja, S-STRUCT, koji modeli generaciju kazne kao planiranje u procesu odluke Markov a. Razvijamo hibridni pristup, koji koristi distribucijsku semantiku da brzo i nepravedno dodaju glavne elemente rečenice, a zatim koristi prvoročne logičke semantike kako bi sporije dodali precizne detalje. Naša hibridna metoda omogućava generaciji S-STRUCT-a biti značajno bolja u ranim fazama generacije i da hibrid često može stvoriti rečenice sa istom kvalitetom kao S-STRUCT u značajno manje vremena. Međutim, mi također posmatramo i pružamo uvid u slučajevima u kojima nepoštenost distribucijskih semantika vodi do generacije koja nije toliko dobra kao upotreba čiste logičke semantike.', 'de': 'Wir betrachten das Problem der Erzeugung natürlicher Sprache als kommunikatives Ziel und Weltbeschreibung. Wir stellen die Frage: Ist es möglich, komplementäre Bedeutungsrepräsentationen zu kombinieren, um ein zielgerichtetes NLG-System zu skalieren, ohne dabei an Expressivität zu verlieren? Insbesondere betrachten wir die Verwendung von zwei Bedeutungsrepräsentationen, eine basierend auf logischer Semantik und die andere basierend auf verteilter Semantik. Wir bauen auf ein bestehendes zielgerichtetes Generierungssystem S-STRUCT auf, das die Satzgeneration als Planung in einem Markov-Entscheidungsprozess modelliert. Wir entwickeln einen hybriden Ansatz, der mithilfe der Verteilungssemmeantik schnell und ungenau die Hauptelemente des Satzes addiert und dann die auf Logik basierende Semantik erster Ordnung verwendet, um die genauen Details langsamer hinzuzufügen. Wir stellen fest, dass unsere Hybridmethode es ermöglicht, die Generierung von S-STRUCT in frühen Phasen der Generierung deutlich besser zu skalieren und dass der Hybrid oft Sätze mit der gleichen Qualität wie S-STRUCT in wesentlich kürzerer Zeit generieren kann. Wir beobachten und geben Einblick in Fälle, in denen die Ungenauigkeit in der Verteilungssemmeantik zu einer Erzeugung führt, die nicht so gut ist wie die reine logische Semantik.', 'id': 'Kita mempertimbangkan masalah menghasilkan bahasa alam dengan tujuan komunikatif dan deskripsi dunia. Kami menanyakan pertanyaan: apakah mungkin menggabungkan represisi arti komplementari untuk skala sistem NLG yang direksi tujuan tanpa kehilangan ekspresivitas? Terutama, kita mempertimbangkan menggunakan dua representation berarti, satu berdasarkan semantik logis dan yang lain berdasarkan semantik distribusi. Kami membangun pada sistem generasi yang ada, S-STRUCT, yang model generasi kalimat sebagai rencana dalam proses keputusan Markov. We develop a hybrid approach, which uses distributional semantics to quickly and imprecisely add the main elements of the sentence and then uses first-order logic based semantics to more slowly add the precise details.  Kami menemukan bahwa metode hibrid kami memungkinkan generasi S-STRUCT untuk skala lebih baik pada tahap awal generasi dan bahwa hibrid sering dapat menghasilkan kalimat dengan kualitas yang sama dengan S-STRUCT dalam waktu yang sangat kurang. Namun, kita juga mengamati dan memberikan penglihatan pada kasus dimana ketidaktepatan dalam semantik distribusi mengarah ke generasi yang tidak sebaik menggunakan semantik logis murni.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل تولید زبان طبیعی را با هدف ارتباطی و توضیح جهانی به نظر می گیریم. ما سوال می پرسیم: آیا ممکن است معنی اضافی را ترکیب کنیم تا یک سیستم NLG هدف را بدون از دست دادن استفاده کنیم؟ مخصوصا، ما با استفاده از دو معنی معنی، یکی بر اساس سیمانتیک منطقی و دیگری بر اساس سیمانتیک تقسیم می\u200cکنیم. ما بر روی سیستم نسل هدف موجود ساختیم S-STRUCT که نسل جمله را به عنوان نقشه\u200cبندی در یک فرایند تصمیم Markov می\u200cسازد. ما یک روش hybrid را توسعه می\u200cکنیم، که از سنتی\u200cهای تقسیم برای سریع و دقیقاً عناصر اصلی از جمله استفاده می\u200cکند، و سپس از سنتی\u200cهای منطقی بنیاد اول استفاده می\u200cکند تا آهسته\u200cتر جزئیات دقیق را اضافه کند. ما متوجه می\u200cشویم که روش hybrid ما به نسل S-STRUCT اجازه می\u200cدهد که در مرحله\u200cهای اول نسل بسیار بهتر مقیاس کنند و که هیبرید اغلب می\u200cتواند جمله\u200cها را با کیفیت همان S-STRUCT در زمان زیادی کمتر تولید کند. ولی ما همچنین مشاهده می کنیم و مشاهده می کنیم در مورد پرونده\u200cهایی که غیر قابل توزیع سیمانتیک\u200cهای تقسیم به نسل می\u200cرسد که به اندازه استفاده از سیمانتیک\u200cهای منطقی پاکیزه نیست.', 'sw': 'Tunafahamu tatizo la kutengeneza lugha ya asili kwa lengo la mawasiliano na maelezo ya dunia. Tunauliza swali: Je, inawezekana kuunganisha maana ya kisiasa ya kuwakilisha mfumo unaoongozwa na NLG bila kupoteza ufahamu? Kwa hakika, tunafikiria kutumia wakilishi wawili, mmoja kwa kutumia mifano ya kisiasa na mwingine kwa kutumia mifano ya usambazaji. Tunajenga kwenye mfumo wa kizazi kinachoongozwa na lengo, S-STRUCT, ambao unaonyesha kizazi cha hukumu kama mpango katika mchakato wa uamuzi wa Markov. Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu za usambazaji, ambazo hutumia mifumo ya usambazaji kwa haraka na kuongeza vipengele muhimu vya hukumu hiyo na baadae hutumia miambo yenye mfumo wa kwanza ili kuongeza kina sahihi. Tunapata kwamba mbinu yetu ya hybrid inaruhusu kizazi cha S-STRUCT kuchukua kiasi kikubwa zaidi katika hatua za mwanzo wa kizazi na kwamba huduma hiyo mara nyingi inaweza kutengeneza hukumu kwa kiwango sawa kama S-STRUCT kwa muda mdogo. Hata hivyo, pia tunatazama na pia tunaweka maoni katika kesi ambapo kutokuwepo kwa mtazamo wa usambazaji unapelekea kizazi ambacho si vizuri kama kutumia mifano safi ya kitaalamu.', 'ko': '우리는 교제 목표와 세계 묘사를 정한 상황에서 자연 언어를 생성하는 문제를 고려한다.우리는 표현 능력을 잃지 않고 상호 보완적인 의미 표현을 결합시켜 목표 지향적인 NLG 시스템을 확장할 수 있느냐는 질문을 던졌다.특히 우리는 두 가지 의미를 사용하는데 하나는 논리적 의미를 바탕으로 하고 다른 하나는 분포적 의미를 바탕으로 하는 것을 고려한다.우리는 기존의 목표 가이드 생성 시스템인 S-STRUCT를 토대로 문장 생성을 마르코프 결정 과정의 계획으로 모델링했다.우리는 분포된 의미를 사용하여 문장의 주요 요소를 신속하고 부정확하게 첨가한 다음에 1단계 논리에 기초한 의미를 사용하여 더욱 천천히 정확한 세부 사항을 첨가하는 혼합 방법을 개발했다.우리의 혼합 방법은 S-STRUCT 생성을 생성 초기 단계에서 더욱 잘 확장할 수 있고 혼합 방법은 보통 S-STRUCT의 질과 같은 문장을 더 짧은 시간 안에 생성할 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.그러나 우리도 분포어의 부정확성으로 인해 생성이 순수한 논리적 의미를 사용하는 것보다 못한 상황을 관찰하고 통찰했다.', 'tr': 'Biz tebigy dili d철retm채ge m체mkin ed첵채n maksady we d체n첵채d채ki waspy bilen d체힊체n첵채ris. Soruyu soruyoruz: G철rev y철n체ndeki NLG sisteminin ifadesini kaybetmeden, a 힊캇r캇lama ifadesini birle힊tirmek m체mk체n m체? 횜zellikle, bir mant캇kl캇 semantik ve di휓erini da휓캇t캇m semantiklerine dayanan iki ifade temsil kullanarak d체힊체n체yoruz. Biz bar maksady y철nlendiril첵채n bir nusga sistemasyna, S-STRUCT, Markowy흫 karar prosesinde 챌철z체mler d철redilmesi 체챌in nusgala al첵arys. Biz hibrid yakla힊캇m캇 geli힊tirdik. Bu b철l체m semantiklerini 챌abuk ve yanl캇힊 힊ekilde s철zlenin esali elementlerini eklemek i챌in kullan캇r. Sonra ilk s캇radan mantik tabanl캇 semantikleri daha yava힊 detaylar캇 eklemek i챌in kullan캇r캇z. Biz hybridlerimizi흫 철n체mizde S-STRUCT d철wletlerini흫 ilkinji d철wletlerde esasy gowy 철l챌ekmesine m체mkin ed첵채ris we hybridlerimiz S-STRUCT 첵aly c체mleleri k철plen챌 azaltyp bil첵채ris 횦철ne biz da휓캇t캇m semantiklerinde takyklyklygy흫 d철wletlere gola첵la힊첵an 첵agda첵lary g철zle첵채ris we d체힊체n첵채ris. Bu d철wletlere t채ze logik semantikleri ulanmakdan hem gowy d채ldir.', 'af': "Ons besluit die probleem om natuurlike taal te genereer wat 'n kommunikasief doel en 'n wêreldsbeskrywing gegee het. Ons vra die vraag: is dit moontlik om komplementêre betekening te kombinieer om 'n doel-direkte NLG stelsel te skaal sonder om uitdrukking te verloor? Ons besluit om twee betekenis te gebruik, een gebaseer op logiese semantieke en die ander gebaseer op verspreidingssemantieke. Ons bou op 'n bestaande doel-direkte generasie stelsel, S-STRUCT, wat model voordeel generasie as planning in 'n Markov besluit proses. Ons ontwikkel 'n hybrid toegang, wat verspreidingssemantieke gebruik om vinnig en onpresies die hoofelemente van die seting te voeg en dan gebruik eerste volgorde logiese gebaseerde semantieke om stadiger die presies details te voeg. Ons vind dat ons hibridmetode toelaat S-STRUCT se generasie beter om te skaleer in vroeg faze van generasie en dat die hibrid dikwels sagte met dieselfde kwaliteit as S-STRUCT in beter minder tyd kan genereer. Maar ons hou ook aansig en gee insig in gevalle waar die impresisie in verspreidingssemantieke lei na generasie wat nie so goed is as om rein logiese semantieke te gebruik nie.", 'sq': 'Ne konsiderojmë problemin e gjenerimit të gjuhës natyrore duke dhënë një qëllim komunikues dhe një përshkrim botëror. Ne bëjmë pyetjen: a është e mundur të kombinohen përfaqësimet komplementare të kuptimit për të shkallëruar një sistem NLG me qëllim pa humbur ekspresivitetin? Në veçanti, ne konsiderojmë përdorimin e dy përfaqësimeve të kuptueshme, një bazuar në semantikën logjike dhe tjetrën bazuar në semantikën shpërndarëse. Ne ndërtojmë mbi një sistem ekzistues të gjeneratës me qëllim, S-STRUCT, i cili modelon gjeneratën e dënimeve si planifikim në një proces vendimi Markov. Ne zhvillojmë një qasje hibride, e cila përdor semantikën shpërndarëse për të shtuar shpejt dhe pa saktësi elementet kryesore të fjalës dhe pastaj përdor semantikën e rendit të parë bazuar në logjikë për të shtuar më ngadalë detajet e sakta. Ne zbulojmë se metoda jonë hibride lejon gjeneratën e S-STRUCT të shkallojë më mirë në fazat e hershme të gjeneratës dhe se hibridi shpesh mund të gjenerojë fjalë me të njëjtin cilësi si S-STRUCT në më pak kohë. However, we also observe and give insight into cases where the imprecision in distributional semantics leads to generation that is not as good as using pure logical semantics.', 'hy': 'Մենք կարծում ենք, որ բնական լեզու ստեղծման խնդիրը հաղորդակցման նպատակ և աշխարհի նկարագրություն է տալիս: Մենք հարցնում ենք. արդյո՞ք հնարավոր է համադրել համալրացող իմաստալից ներկայացումներ նպատակով ուղղված ՆԼԳ համակարգի չափսելու համար առանց կորցնելու արտահայտությունը: Մենք հատկապես մտածում ենք օգտագործել երկու նշանակալի ներկայացումներ, մեկը հիմնված է տրամաբանական սեմանտիկայի վրա, իսկ մյուսը՝ բաշխման սեմանտիկայի վրա: We build upon an existing goal-directed generation system, S-STRUCT, which models sentence generation as planning in a Markov decision process.  Մենք զարգանում ենք հիբրիդ մոտեցում, որը օգտագործում է բաշխման սեմանտիկա արագ և անճշգրիտ ավելացնելու նախադասության հիմնական տարրերը և հետո օգտագործում է առաջին դասակարգում տրամաբանական սեմանտիկա ավելի դանդաղ ավելացնելու ճշգրիտ մանրամասները: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մեր հիբրիդ մեթոդը թույլ է տալիս S-Ստրուկտի սերնդին ավելի լավ մեծացնել սերնդի սկզբնական փուլում, և որ հիբրիդը հաճախ կարող է ստեղծել նախադասություններ նույն որակով, ինչ S-Ստրուկտը, ավելի քիչ ժամանակում: Այնուամենայնիվ, մենք նաև հետազոտում ենք և ընկալում այն դեպքերը, երբ բաշխման սեմանտիկայի անճշգրտությունը հանգեցնում է սերունդ, որը այնքան էլ լավ չէ, որքան մաքուր տրամաբանական սեմանտիկայի օգտագործումը:', 'az': "Biz təbiətli dil yaratmanın problemini və dünya təfsiləsini təşkil edirik. Biz suala soruşuruq: məqsəd-yönəlmiş NLG sisteminin səviyyəsini itirmədən, əlavə etmək mümkün mümkün mü? Özellikle, biz iki məsələni, bir logik semantik və digərini dağıtıcı semantik kimi istifadə etməyi düşünürük. Biz Markov kararı sürətində planlaşdırmaq üçün məqsədilə yönəlmiş nəsil sistemi, S-STRUCT'u in şa edirik. Biz hibrid tərzini təşkil edirik ki, dağıtıcı semantik tezliklə və yanlış sözlərin ana elementlərini əlavə edir və sonra ilk sırada logik tabanlı semantik istifadə edir və daha yavaş detayları əlavə edir. Bizim hibrid metodumuz S-STRUCT nəslinin ilk nəsillərində daha yaxşı ölçməs in ə imkan verir və hibrid çox az zamanda S-STRUCT kimi cümlələr yarada bilər. Lakin biz həmçin in dağıtılma semantikalarının təmiz logik semantikalarını istifadə etməyə qədər yaxşı olan nəsillərə yol göstərir və baxır.", 'bn': 'আমরা বিবেচনা করি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা তৈরি করার সমস্যা, যোগাযোগের লক্ষ্য এবং বিশ্বের বর্ণনা দিয়েছে। আমরা প্রশ্ন জিজ্ঞেস করছি: প্রকাশ না হারিয়ে একটি লক্ষ্য-নির্দেশিত এনএলজি সিস্টেমের প্রতিনিধিদের সাজানোর জন্য কি সম্ভব? বিশেষ করে, আমরা দুই মানে প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে বিবেচনা করি, একটি লোগিক্যাল সেমেন্টিক্স এবং অন্যটি বিতরণের সেমেন্ট আমরা বিদ্যমান গন্তব্যের নির্দেশিত প্রজন্ম ব্যবস্থার উপর নির্মাণ করি, S-STRUCT, যা মার্কোভ সিদ্ধান্ত প্রক্রিয়ার পরিকল্পনায় আমরা একটি হাইব্রিডের প্রযুক্তি তৈরি করি, যা দ্রুত বিতরণের সেমান্টিক ব্যবহার করে এই বাক্যের মূল উপাদান যোগ করে এবং তারপর প্রথম অর্ডারের ভিত্তিক সেমান আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে আমাদের হাইব্রিড পদ্ধতি এস-স্ট্রুসিটের প্রজন্মের প্রজন্ম প্রজন্মের প্রথম ক্ষেত্রে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাল আকারের সুযোগ দেয় এবং এই হাইব্র কিন্তু আমরা এই ঘটনায় পর্যবেক্ষণ করি এবং দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রদান করি যেখানে বিতরণের সেম্যান্টিকের অকৃতজ্ঞতা প্রজন্মের কাছে নিয়ে যা', 'am': 'የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ መፍጠር ጉዳይ የግንኙነት አቃውሞ እና የዓለማዊ ትርጓሜ እንዲሰጥ እንቆጥራለን፡፡ ጥያቄን እንጠይቃለን፤ አካባቢ አካላቢ የNLG ስርዓት ውጤት ሳይጎድል መቆጣጠር ይችላልን? በተለይም፣ ሁለት ማህበረሰቢያ መልዕክቶች በመጠቀም አንዱን logical semantics እና ሁለተኛውን በተለያየ ስሜቲካ በመሠረት ላይ እንቆጥራለን፡፡ የአሁኑ ጉዳይ የሆኑን ጉዳይ ትውልድ ስSTRUCT (S-STRUCT) ላይ እንሠራለን፡፡ We develop a hybrid approach, which uses distributional semantics to quickly and imprecisely add the main elements of the sentence and then uses first-order logic based semantics to more slowly add the precise details.  የኬብሪድ ልማድ የS-STRUCT ትውልድ ትውልድ በመጀመሪያው ክፍል ትክክል እንዲለይ እንዲፈቅድ እና ደብዳቤ በጊዜው በትክክል ትንሽ ጊዜ እንደS-STRUCT ክፍተቶችን በሚያስፈልጋል እንደሆነ እናገኛለን፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ በተለያዩ ስሜቲካ ውስጥ ጥሩ የሎጂካዊ ስሜክቲ እንደተጠቃሚ ሳይሆን ትውልድ ወደሚመራበት ጉዳይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Smatramo problem stvaranja prirodnog jezika s obzirom na komunikacijski cilj i opis svijeta. Postavljamo pitanje: da li je moguće kombinirati komplementarno značenje predstavljanja za skalu ciljevskog sistema NLG bez gubitka izrazitosti? Posebno, razmišljamo o korištenju dva značaja predstavljanja, jedna zasnovana na logičkim semanticima i druga zasnovana na distribucijskim semanticima. Mi izgradimo na postojećem sustavu generacije cilja, S-STRUCT, koji modeli generaciju kazne kao planiranje u procesu odluke Markov a. Razvijamo hibridni pristup, koji koristi distribucijsku semantiku da brzo i nepravedno dodaju glavne elemente rečenice, a onda koristi prvi red logičke semantike da sporije dodaju precizne detalje. Naša hibridna metoda omogućava generaciji S-STRUCT da se u ranim fazama generacije značajno bolje skalira i da hibrid često može stvoriti rečenice sa istom kvalitetom kao S-STRUCT u značajno manje vremena. Međutim, mi također posmatramo i pružamo uvid u slučajevima u kojima neprecesija u distribucijskoj semantici vodi do generacije koja nije toliko dobra kao koristiti čiste logičke semantike.', 'ca': "Considerem el problem a de generar un llenguatge natural amb un objectiu comunicatiu i una descripció mundial. Ens preguntem: és possible combinar representacions de significat complementar per escalar un sistema de GNL orientat cap als objectius sense perdre expressivitat? En particular, considerem utilitzar dues representacions significatives, una basada en semàntica lògica i l'altra basada en semàntica distribucional. Construim sobre un sistema de generació dirigit als objectius, S-STRUCT, que modela la generació de frases com a planificació en un procés de decisió Markov. Desenvolvem un enfocament híbrid, que utilitza semàntica distribucional per afegir ràpidament i imprecisament els elements principals de la frase i després utilitza semàntica basada en lògica de primer ordre per afegir més lentament els detalls exacts. Trobem que el nostre mètode híbrid permet a la generació d'S-STRUCT escalar significativament millor en les primeres fases de generació i que l'híbrid sovint pot generar frases de la mateixa qualitat que S-STRUCT en molt menys temps. Tot i així, també observem i donem insight en casos en què l'imprecisió en la semàntica distribucional condueix a una generació que no és tan bona com utilitzar la semàntica lògica pura.", 'cs': 'Problém generování přirozeného jazyka považujeme za komunikační cíl a popis světa. Položíme otázku: je možné kombinovat doplňkové významové reprezentace k škálování cílově orientovaného NLG systému bez ztráty expresivity? Konkrétně uvažujeme o použití dvou významových reprezentací, jedna založená na logické sémantice a druhá založená na distribuční sémantice. Stavíme na stávajícím cílově orientovaném generačním systému S-STRUCT, který modeluje generování vět jako plánování v Markovském rozhodovacím procesu. Vyvíjíme hybridní přístup, který používá distribuční sémantiku k rychlému a nepřesnému přidání hlavních prvků věty a následně používá sémantiku založenou na logice prvního řádu k pomalejšímu přidávání přesných detailů. Zjišťujeme, že naše hybridní metoda umožňuje generaci S-STRUCT výrazně lépe škálovat v raných fázích generace a že hybrid může často generovat věty stejné kvality jako S-STRUCT v podstatně kratším čase. Pozorujeme však i případy, kdy nepřesnost distribuční sémantiky vede k generaci, která není tak dobrá jako použití čisté logické sémantiky.', 'et': 'Me peame looduskeele genereerimise probleemi kommunikatiivseks eesmärgiks ja maailma kirjelduseks. Me küsime küsimuse: kas on võimalik kombineerida täiendavaid tähendusrepresentatsioone eesmärgile suunatud NLG süsteemi mastaapimiseks ilma ekspressiivsust kaotamata? Eelkõige kaalume kahe tähendusekujunduse kasutamist, üks põhineb loogilisel semantikal ja teine jaotussemantikal. Tugineme olemasolevale eesmärgipõhisele generatsioonisüsteemile S-STRUCT, mis modelleerib lausegeneratsiooni planeerimisena Markovi otsustusprotsessis. Töötame välja hübriidse lähenemisviisi, mis kasutab jaotussemantikat lause peamiste elementide kiireks ja ebatäpseks lisamiseks ning seejärel kasutab täpsete detailide aeglasemaks lisamiseks esimese astme loogikapõhist semantikat. Leiame, et meie hübriidmeetod võimaldab S-STRUCTi generatsioonil märkimisväärselt paremini skaleerida põlvkonna algfaasis ja et hübriid suudab sageli tekitada S-STRUCTiga sama kvaliteediga lauseid oluliselt lühema aja jooksul. Samas jälgime ja anname ülevaate juhtudest, kus ebatäpsus jaotussemantikas viib genereerimiseni, mis ei ole nii hea kui puhta loogilise semantika kasutamine.', 'fi': 'Luonnonkielen tuottamisen ongelmaa pidetään kommunikatiivisena tavoitteena ja maailmankuvana. Kysymme, onko mahdollista yhdistää toisiaan täydentäviä merkitysrepresentaatioita tavoitteelliseen NLG-järjestelmään menettämättä ekspressiivisyyttä? Erityisesti pohdimme kahden merkityksen esittämistä, joista toinen perustuu loogiseen semantiikkaan ja toinen jakelusemantiikkaan. Kehitämme olemassa olevaa tavoitteellista tuotantojärjestelmää, S-STRUCT, joka mallintaa lauseiden tuottamista suunnitteluna Markovin päätöksentekoprosessissa. Kehitämme hybridiajattelun, joka lisää lauseen pääelementit nopeasti ja epätarkkasti jakelusemantiikan avulla ja lisää tarkemmat yksityiskohdat hitaammin ensimmäisen asteen logiikkapohjaisella semantiikalla. Havaitsemme, että hybridimenetelmämme mahdollistaa S-STRUCTin sukupolven skaalautumisen huomattavasti paremmin alkuvaiheissa ja että hybridi voi usein tuottaa S-STRUCTin kaltaisia lauseita huomattavasti lyhyemmässä ajassa. Havaitsemme kuitenkin myös tapauksia, joissa jakelusemantiikan epätarkkuus johtaa generointiin, joka ei ole yhtä hyvä kuin puhtaan loogisen semantiikan käyttö.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙaddara mataimaki ta sami ƙiro lugha na natsuwa da wani goani na koma da misalin duniya. Munã tambayar su: Shin, za'a iya haɗa ma'anar masu kamfata da ma'anar da za'a sami tsarin wata na'urar NLG wanda aka shiryar da shi gaba ɗaya kuma bã ya kusa haske mai bayyana? Kayyai, munã fatan mu yi amfani da misalin biyu, ɗayan a kan muhimmada da sakan mutane da ɗayan a kan sakan da aka raba mutane. Tuna samar da wani tsarin da aka shirya goani da ke gaba, S-SARUAT, wanda ke motsa kizayen cewa kamar an a yi shirin da a cikin jarrabin zartar da maroko. Tuna buɗe wata hanyor Hybri, da ta yi amfani da rabo-sakanti ga haraka kuma za'a ƙara ƙanshi masu muhimmi na maganar, kuma za'a yi amfani da kimada masu ƙayyade na kwanza-tarakin, don a ƙara bayani, daki-daki masu ƙayyade. Tuna gane cewa hanyoyinmu na yarda da tarakin S-StRUcc ya yi taƙaita mai girma a fara fassaran birnin na haifa, kuma da cewa ya iya ƙara ga hibiri ko da yawa, za'a iya ƙiƙiro azãba da misãlin S-SCRRUAT kuma a ƙara lokacin. Kayya, ko da haka, tuna kuma tuna gane a cikin kashfa ambako musamman da za'a samura da mutane na halatar da kizafi wanda bai zama daidai ba da amfani da mutane mai tsari.", 'he': 'אנחנו שוקלים את הבעיה של ליצור שפה טבעית בהתחשב במטרה תקשורת ותיאור עולמי. אנו שואלים את השאלה: האם אפשרי לשלב מייצגים משמעותיים משלמתיים כדי לקדם מערכת NLG ממוקדת מטרה מבלי לאבד ביטוי? במיוחד, אנחנו שוקלים להשתמש בשני מייצגים משמעותיים, אחד מבוסס על סמנטיקה הגיונית והשני מבוסס על סמנטיקה פיצועית. אנו בונים על מערכת דור מיועדת למטרה קיימת, S-STRUCT, אשר דוגמנים דוגמנים יוצר משפטים כתכנון בתהליך החלטה מרקוב. אנחנו מפתחים גישה היברידית, אשר משתמשת בסמנטיקה פיצועית כדי להוסיף מהר ולא מדויק את אלמנטים הראשיים של המשפט אנו מוצאים ששיטת היברידית שלנו מאפשרת לדור של S-STRUCT לגדול יותר טוב באופן משמעותי בשלבים מוקדמים של הדור ושהיברידים לעתים קרובות יכולים ליצור משפטים באותה איכות כמו S-STRUCT בעוד הרבה פחות זמן. בכל אופן, אנו מתבוננים וגם נותנים תובנה למקרים שבו הלא מדויק בסמנטיקה פיצועית מוביל לדור שלא טוב כמו להשתמש בסמנטיקה הגיונית טהורה.', 'sk': 'Problem ustvarjanja naravnega jezika obravnavamo kot komunikacijski cilj in opis sveta. Postavljamo vprašanje: ali je mogoče združiti komplementarne pomenske reprezentacije za skaliranje ciljno usmerjenega sistema NLG brez izgube izraznosti? Predvsem obravnavamo uporabo dveh pomenskih predstavitev, ena temelji na logični semantiki in druga na distribucijski semantiki. Gradimo na obstoječem ciljno usmerjenem generacijskem sistemu S-STRUCT, ki generiranje stavkov modelira kot načrtovanje v Markovem procesu odločanja. Razvijamo hibridni pristop, ki uporablja distribucijsko semantiko za hitro in nenatančno dodajanje glavnih elementov stavka, nato pa uporablja logično osnovano semantiko prvega reda za počasnejše dodajanje natančnih podrobnosti. Ugotavljamo, da naša hibridna metoda omogoča generaciji S-STRUCT bistveno boljše skaliranje v zgodnjih fazah generacije in da lahko hibrid pogosto ustvari stavke enake kakovosti kot S-STRUCT v bistveno krajšem času. Vendar pa tudi opazujemo in dajemo vpogled v primere, ko nenatančnost distribucijske semantike vodi do generacije, ki ni tako dobra kot uporaba čiste logične semantike.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sawetara perbudhakan kanggo nggawe luwih-luwih bantuan ngono nggawe barang dunya. Awak dhéwé sik ujian: iso nggambar kelompterar seneng pisan kang dipun ciptaaken NLG kuwi dianggawe barang nggawe gerakan kelompterar seneng pisan kang dipun ciptaaken NLG ? Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé ngerasakno gambar 2 kabèh dikarepréntasi, éwé basa sak semanti lèhku lan kabèh liyane basa semanti ngregani. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing dadi nggawe goal-direction, S-STARUUUT, sing paling model kuwi nggawe barang kelas pirsor dumadhi kanggo nguasai perusahaan Markow Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem histogram, sing wis nggawe semanti-pakan anyar tentang kanggo nambah winih lan basa kuwi perintah sing gak dhéwé. Unya wis nguasai sistem sistem sing basa semanti-tekan anyar luwih apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé kuwi: Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih hal-hal iki dadi, nik akeh hal-hal ngelarang mulalah sing luwih nggawe barang-hal bisa nguasai winih jenis-jenis hukum iki ulih sedhaya winih jenis bakal terus winih dhéwé ketawak dhéwé winih-jenis barang langgar sampeyan koyok sinar tentang karo S-KE Nanging, awake awake dhéwé mulai lan ngerasah kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasah sematik tentang kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi duluran ngono kuwi sematik dhéwé.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྐད་རིགས་གསར་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་འགྲེལ་བཤད ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་འདི་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་བའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་འདོགས་དགོས་སམ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་གསལ་བཤད་གཉིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟེ། གཞན་ནི་ལྟོས་རྩོད་པ་དང་། གཞན་ནི་རྩོད་སྤྲོད ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱིས་དམིགས་འབེབས་བྱས་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་ S-STRUCT་ལ་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། Markov་འཆར་གཞི་སྒྲིག་གི་ལས་ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོར་སྐྱེས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།རྩ་བ་སྐྱེས་ཚོར་གྱི་རྩ་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཚམས་འཇོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཆུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་S-STRUCT་གི་མི་ཚེ་རྣམས་པས་འགྱུར་མྱོང་བའི་དཔེ་བས། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱས་པའི་སྐབས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ནང་གི་རྐྱེན་རིས་ལ་འགྱུར་རྐྱེན་འདྲེན་པའི་སྐྱེན་རིས་དེ་འད'}
{'en': 'Deduplicating Training Data Makes Language Models Better', 'ar': 'توقع الموافقة على التدخل في التجارب السريرية من خلال تلخيص متعدد الوثائق', 'es': 'Predicción de la aprobación de intervenciones en ensayos clínicos mediante el resumen de varios documentos', 'pt': 'Prevendo a aprovação da intervenção em ensaios clínicos por meio da sumarização de vários documentos', 'fr': "Prédire l'approbation des interventions dans les essais cliniques grâce à la synthèse multi-documents", 'ja': '複数文書の要約による臨床試験における介入承認の予測', 'zh': '以多文档总占临床试验中干预可', 'hi': 'बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के माध्यम से नैदानिक परीक्षणों में हस्तक्षेप अनुमोदन की भविष्यवाणी करना', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование одобрения вмешательства в клинических исследованиях с помощью суммирования нескольких документов', 'ga': 'Faomhadh Idirghabhála i dTrialacha Cliniciúla a Thuar trí Achoimriú Ildhoiciméad', 'ka': 'მრავალე დოკუმენტის კომპანიზაციაში ინტერვინციის მიღება', 'el': 'Προβλέποντας την έγκριση παρέμβασης σε κλινικές δοκιμές μέσω συνοψίσματος πολλαπλών εγγράφων', 'hu': 'Az intervenció jóváhagyásának előrejelzése klinikai vizsgálatokban többdokumentumos összefoglalással', 'it': "Prevedere l'approvazione degli interventi negli studi clinici attraverso la sintesi multi-documento", 'kk': 'Көп құжат тұжырымдамасы арқылы клиникалық сынақтардың интервенциясының баптауы', 'mk': 'Предвидување на одобрување на интервенција во клиничките процеси преку резултат на повеќе документи', 'lt': 'Intervencijos patvirtinimo klinikiniuose tyrimuose numatymas daugiadokumentais apibendrinant', 'mt': 'Tbassir ta’ Approvazzjoni ta’ Intervent fi Provi Kliniċi permezz ta’ Sommarju ta’ Multi-Dokumenti', 'mn': 'Мөн олон документийн цуглуулга дамжуулан Сэтгэл Судалгаанд Интервенционы хүлээн зөвшөөрөх', 'ms': 'Menimbangkan Pengesahan Intervention dalam Ujian Klinik melalui Ringkasan Dokumen Berberbilang', 'ml': 'ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഇന്റര്\u200dവെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d മുന്\u200dഗണന നടത്തുന്നു', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie zatwierdzenia interwencji w badaniach klinicznych poprzez podsumowanie wielu dokumentów', 'ro': 'Prevederea aprobării intervenției în studiile clinice prin rezumarea mai multor documente', 'no': 'Forventing Intervention Approval in Clinical Trials through Multi-Document Summarization', 'sr': 'Predviđavajući odobrenje intervencije u kliničkim ispitivanjima kroz samarizaciju višestrukog dokumenta', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ලිපින්ත සංවේදනය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා', 'so': 'Horumarinta heshiiska baaritaanka dhibaatooyinka dhaqaale', 'sv': 'Förutsägning av godkännande av intervention i kliniska prövningar genom sammanfattning av flera dokument', 'ta': 'பல- ஆவணங்கள் சுருக்கமாக்குதல் வழியாக இடைவெளியீடு முன்னேற்றம் அனுமதிக்கப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'Multi-Document Summarization', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dự đoán chấp nhận can thiệp trong thử nghiệm lâm sàng qua tổng kết nhiều tài liệu', 'nl': 'Voorspelling van interventiegoedkeuring in klinische proeven door samenvatting van meerdere documenten', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af godkendelse af intervention i kliniske forsøg gennem sammenfatning af flere dokumenter', 'hr': 'Predviđavajući odobrenje intervencije u kliničkim ispitivanjima kroz sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на одобрението на интервенцията в клинични изпитвания чрез обобщаване на множество документи', 'ko': '다중 문헌을 종합하여 임상시험에서의 개입 비준을 예측하다', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی تصمیم تحقیقات بیماری در آزمایشات کلینیکی از طریق جمع\u200cآوری سند\u200cهای زیادی', 'id': 'Memprediksi Penerimaan Interventi dalam Ujian Klinik melalui Penapisan Multi-Dokumen', 'de': 'Vorhersage der Zulassung von Interventionen in klinischen Studien durch Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente', 'tr': 'Çot-Sened Toplaýyşy bilen Kliniki Sözlerde Mazmunlar Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Voorskou Intervention Approval in Kliniese Probeerings deur Multi- Document Opsomming', 'sw': 'Wakati wa kujiandaa kuingiliwa katika mashitaka ya KiClinic kupitia muhtasari wa Makala mengi', 'am': 'የክሊኪያ ፈተናዎች በMulti-Document ማጠቃለያ', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i miratimit të ndërhyrjes në provat klinike nëpërmjet përmbledhjes së shumëdokumenteve', 'hy': 'Կլինիկական փորձարկումների ընդունության կանխատեսումը բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման միջոցով', 'az': 'Multi-Document Summarization', 'bs': 'Predviđavajući odobrenje intervencije u kliničkim ispitivanjima kroz sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'bn': 'অনেক ডকুমেন্ট সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত মাধ্যমে ক্লিনিক বিচারের মধ্যে ইন্টারনেটিভেশনের প্রেকশন', 'ca': 'Predicting Intervention Approval in Clinical Trials through Multi-Document Summarization', 'fi': 'Intervention hyväksynnän ennustaminen kliinisissä tutkimuksissa useiden asiakirjojen yhteenvedon avulla', 'et': 'Sekkumise heakskiitmise prognoosimine kliinilistes uuringutes mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtte kaudu', 'cs': 'Předpověď schválení intervence v klinických hodnoceních prostřednictvím vícedokumentového shrnutí', 'jv': 'Sugeng arahan intervehensi nggunakake Ketoken Diwurung Daftar-Dokumen Samurasi', 'he': 'צפוי אישור התערבות בניסויים קליניים באמצעות מסמכים רבים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje odobritve intervencije v kliničnih preskušanjih s povzetkom več dokumentov', 'bo': 'མཐོང་སྣང་མང་བོར་ཡིག་ཚང་བསྡུས་ནས་གནད་སྡུད་གླེང་བའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་རྗེས་མཁན་'}
{'en': 'We find that existing language modeling datasets contain many near duplicate examples and long repetitive substrings As a result over of the unprompted output of language models trained on these datasets is copied verbatim from the training data We develop two tools that allow us to deduplicate training datasets --- for example removing from C4 a single word English sentence that is repeated over 60,000 times Deduplication allows us to train models that emit memorized text ten times less frequently and require fewer training steps to achieve the same or better accuracy We can also reduce train test overlap which affects over of the validation set of standard datasets thus allowing for more accurate evaluation Code for deduplication is released at https://github.com/google-research/deduplicate-text-datasets', 'ar': 'توفر التجارب السريرية فرصة أساسية لاكتشاف علاجات جديدة وتعزيز المعرفة الطبية. ومع ذلك ، فإن عدم التيقن من نتيجة المحاكمة يمكن أن يؤدي إلى تكاليف وانتكاسات غير متوقعة. في هذه الدراسة ، نقترح طريقة جديدة للتنبؤ بفعالية التدخل في تجربة سريرية. تعتمد طريقتنا على إنشاء ملخص إعلامي من وثائق متعددة متوفرة في الأدبيات حول التدخل قيد الدراسة. على وجه التحديد ، تجمع طريقتنا أولاً جميع ملخصات مقالات PubMed المتعلقة بالتدخل. بعد ذلك ، يتم استخلاص جملة الدليل ، التي تنقل معلومات حول فعالية التدخل ، تلقائيًا من كل ملخص. بناءً على مجموعة جمل الأدلة المستخرجة من الملخصات ، يتم إنشاء ملخص قصير حول التدخل. أخيرًا ، يتم استخدام الملخصات المنتجة لتدريب المصنف القائم على BERT ، من أجل استنتاج فعالية التدخل. لتقييم طريقتنا المقترحة ، نقدم مجموعة بيانات جديدة وهي عبارة عن مجموعة من التجارب السريرية جنبًا إلى جنب مع مقالات PubMed المرتبطة بها. توضح تجاربنا فعالية إنتاج ملخصات إعلامية قصيرة واستخدامها للتنبؤ بفعالية التدخل.', 'es': 'Los ensayos clínicos ofrecen una oportunidad fundamental para descubrir nuevos tratamientos y mejorar los conocimientos médicos. Sin embargo, la incertidumbre del resultado de un ensayo puede llevar a costos y contratiempos imprevistos. En este estudio, proponemos un nuevo método para predecir la eficacia de una intervención en un ensayo clínico. Nuestro método se basa en generar un resumen informativo a partir de múltiples documentos disponibles en la literatura sobre la intervención en estudio. Específicamente, nuestro método primero reúne todos los resúmenes de los artículos de PubMed relacionados con la intervención. Luego, se extrae automáticamente de cada resumen una oración de evidencia, que transmite información sobre la eficacia de la intervención. Basado en el conjunto de sentencias de evidencia extraídas de los resúmenes, se construye un breve resumen sobre la intervención. Finalmente, los resúmenes producidos se utilizan para entrenar a un clasificador basado en BERT, con el fin de inferir la eficacia de una intervención. Para evaluar nuestro método propuesto, presentamos un nuevo conjunto de datos que es una colección de ensayos clínicos junto con sus artículos de PubMed asociados. Nuestros experimentos demuestran la eficacia de producir resúmenes informativos breves y usarlos para predecir la eficacia de una intervención.', 'fr': "Les essais cliniques offrent une opportunité fondamentale de découvrir de nouveaux traitements et de faire progresser les connaissances médicales. Cependant, l'incertitude quant à l'issue d'un essai peut entraîner des coûts et des revers imprévus. Dans cette étude, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode pour prédire l'efficacité d'une intervention dans un essai clinique. Notre méthode repose sur la génération d'un résumé informatif à partir de plusieurs documents disponibles dans la littérature sur l'intervention à l'étude. Plus précisément, notre méthode rassemble d'abord tous les résumés des articles PubMed relatifs à l'intervention. Ensuite, une phrase de preuve, qui transmet des informations sur l'efficacité de l'intervention, est extraite automatiquement de chaque résumé. Sur la base de l'ensemble des phrases de preuves extraites des résumés, un bref résumé de l'intervention est construit. Enfin, les résumés produits sont utilisés pour former un classificateur basé sur BERT, afin de déduire l'efficacité d'une intervention. Pour évaluer la méthode que nous proposons, nous introduisons un nouvel ensemble de données qui est une collection d'essais cliniques ainsi que leurs articles PubMed associés. Nos expériences démontrent l'efficacité de la production de courts résumés informatifs et de leur utilisation pour prédire l'efficacité d'une intervention.", 'pt': 'Os ensaios clínicos oferecem uma oportunidade fundamental para descobrir novos tratamentos e avançar o conhecimento médico. No entanto, a incerteza do resultado de um julgamento pode levar a custos e contratempos imprevistos. Neste estudo, propomos um novo método para prever a eficácia de uma intervenção em um ensaio clínico. Nosso método baseia-se na geração de um resumo informativo a partir de vários documentos disponíveis na literatura sobre a intervenção em estudo. Especificamente, nosso método primeiro reúne todos os resumos de artigos do PubMed relacionados à intervenção. Em seguida, é extraída automaticamente de cada resumo uma frase de evidência, que transmite informações sobre a eficácia da intervenção. Com base no conjunto de sentenças de evidência extraídas dos resumos, é construído um breve resumo sobre a intervenção. Por fim, os resumos produzidos são usados para treinar um classificador baseado em BERT, a fim de inferir a eficácia de uma intervenção. Para avaliar nosso método proposto, apresentamos um novo conjunto de dados que é uma coleção de ensaios clínicos juntamente com seus artigos PubMed associados. Nossos experimentos demonstram a eficácia de produzir resumos informativos curtos e usá-los para prever a eficácia de uma intervenção.', 'ja': '臨床試験は、新しい治療法を発見し、医学的知識を進歩させるための基本的な機会を提供します。 しかし、裁判の結果の不確実性は、予期せぬコストと挫折につながる可能性があります。 本研究では、臨床試験における介入の有効性を予測するための新しい方法を提案する。 私たちの方法は、研究中の介入に関する文献で利用可能な複数の文書から情報のある要約を生成することに依存しています。 具体的には、私たちの方法はまず、介入に関連するPubMed記事のすべての要約を収集します。 次に、介入の有効性に関する情報を伝える証拠文を各要約から自動的に抽出する。 要約から抽出された一連の証拠文に基づいて、介入についての短い要約が構築される。 最後に、作成された要約は、介入の有効性を推測するために、BERTベースの分類子をトレーニングするために使用されます。 提案された方法を評価するために、私たちは新しいデータセットを紹介します。これは、関連するPubMed論文とともに臨床試験のコレクションです。 私たちの実験では、短い情報の要約を作成し、介入の有効性を予測するためにそれらを使用することの有効性を実証します。', 'hi': 'नैदानिक परीक्षण नए उपचारों की खोज करने और चिकित्सा ज्ञान को आगे बढ़ाने का एक मौलिक अवसर प्रदान करते हैं। हालांकि, एक परीक्षण के परिणाम की अनिश्चितता अप्रत्याशित लागत और असफलताओं को जन्म दे सकती है। इस अध्ययन में, हम एक नैदानिक परीक्षण में हस्तक्षेप की प्रभावशीलता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक नई विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारी विधि अध्ययन के तहत हस्तक्षेप के बारे में साहित्य में उपलब्ध कई दस्तावेजों से एक जानकारीपूर्ण सारांश उत्पन्न करने पर निर्भर करती है। विशेष रूप से, हमारी विधि पहले हस्तक्षेप से संबंधित PubMed लेखों के सभी सार तत्वों को इकट्ठा करती है। फिर, एक सबूत वाक्य, जो हस्तक्षेप की प्रभावशीलता के बारे में जानकारी देता है, प्रत्येक सार से स्वचालित रूप से निकाला जाता है। सार तत्वों से निकाले गए साक्ष्य वाक्यों के सेट के आधार पर, हस्तक्षेप के बारे में एक संक्षिप्त सारांश का निर्माण किया जाता है। अंत में, उत्पादित सारांश का उपयोग BERT-आधारित क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए किया जाता है, ताकि हस्तक्षेप की प्रभावशीलता का अनुमान लगाया जा सके। हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए, हम एक नया डेटासेट पेश करते हैं जो उनके संबंधित PubMed लेखों के साथ नैदानिक परीक्षणों का एक संग्रह है। हमारे प्रयोग, लघु जानकारीपूर्ण सारांश का उत्पादन करने और हस्तक्षेप की प्रभावशीलता की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए उनका उपयोग करने की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'zh': '临床试验见新疗法进医学知识资其本末。 然试之不确定性可致不可见之本挫也。 于此论之,临床试验与有效性新法。 吾法赖文献所究干预者数文档生息丰摘要。 具体来说,吾法首采PubMed文之所有摘要。 然后每摘要自取一证句,当传干预有效性息。 取摘要证句,构干简摘要。 最后,生摘要以练BERT之器,以断干预之有效性。 为估吾法,引入一新数集,当数集是临床试验及相关PubMed文章之集。 吾实验验短息摘要而用之以占有效性有效性。', 'ru': 'Клинические испытания предоставляют фундаментальную возможность открыть для себя новые методы лечения и расширить медицинские знания. Однако неопределенность результатов судебного разбирательства может привести к непредвиденным расходам и неудачам. В этом исследовании мы предлагаем новый метод прогнозирования эффективности вмешательства в клиническом исследовании. Наш метод основан на формировании информативного резюме из множества документов, доступных в литературе об исследуемом вмешательстве. В частности, наш метод сначала собирает все тезисы статей PubMed, связанных с вмешательством. Затем из каждого реферата автоматически извлекается доказательственное предложение, которое передает информацию об эффективности вмешательства. На основе набора доказательственных предложений, извлеченных из рефератов, строится краткое резюме о вмешательстве. Наконец, полученные резюме используются для обучения классификатора на основе BERT, чтобы вывести эффективность вмешательства. Чтобы оценить предлагаемый нами метод, мы вводим новый набор данных, который представляет собой набор клинических испытаний вместе с соответствующими статьями PubMed. Наши эксперименты демонстрируют эффективность составления кратких информативных сводок и их использования для прогнозирования эффективности вмешательства.', 'ga': "Tugann trialacha cliniciúla deis bhunúsach chun cóireálacha nua a aimsiú agus an t-eolas leighis a chur chun cinn. Mar sin féin, d’fhéadfadh costais agus bacanna gan choinne a bheith mar thoradh ar éiginnteacht thoradh trialach. Sa staidéar seo, molaimid modh nua chun éifeachtúlacht idirghabhála i dtriail chliniciúil a thuar. Braitheann ár modh ar achoimre fhaisnéiseach a ghiniúint ó iliomad doiciméad atá ar fáil sa litríocht faoin idirghabháil atá á staidéar. Go sonrach, bailíonn ár modh ar dtús na coimrithe go léir d'earraí PubMed a bhaineann leis an idirghabháil. Ansin, baintear abairt fhianaise, a thugann faisnéis faoi éifeachtúlacht na hidirghabhála, as gach teibí go huathoibríoch. Bunaithe ar an tsraith abairtí fianaise a bhaintear as na hachoimrí, déantar achoimre ghearr ar an idirghabháil. Ar deireadh, úsáidtear na hachoimrí a tháirgtear chun aicmitheoir bunaithe ar BERT a oiliúint, chun éifeachtúlacht idirghabhála a bhaint amach. Chun ár modh molta a mheas, tugaimid tacar sonraí nua isteach, ar bailiúchán é de thrialacha cliniciúla mar aon leis na hailt PubMed a bhaineann leo. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh éifeachtacht achoimrí gearra faisnéiseacha a tháirgeadh agus a úsáid chun éifeachtúlacht idirghabhála a thuar.", 'el': 'Οι κλινικές δοκιμές προσφέρουν μια θεμελιώδη ευκαιρία να ανακαλύψουν νέες θεραπείες και να προωθήσουν τις ιατρικές γνώσεις. Ωστόσο, η αβεβαιότητα σχετικά με το αποτέλεσμα μιας δίκης μπορεί να οδηγήσει σε απρόβλεπτα έξοδα και αποτυχίες. Στην παρούσα μελέτη προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο πρόβλεψης της αποτελεσματικότητας μιας παρέμβασης σε μια κλινική δοκιμή. Η μέθοδος μας βασίζεται στη δημιουργία μιας ενημερωτικής περίληψης από πολλαπλά έγγραφα διαθέσιμα στη βιβλιογραφία σχετικά με την υπό μελέτη παρέμβαση. Συγκεκριμένα, η μέθοδος μας συγκεντρώνει πρώτα όλες τις αφηγήσεις των άρθρων που σχετίζονται με την παρέμβαση. Στη συνέχεια, μια πρόταση αποδεικτικών στοιχείων, η οποία μεταφέρει πληροφορίες σχετικά με την αποτελεσματικότητα της παρέμβασης, εξάγεται αυτόματα από κάθε περίληψη. Με βάση το σύνολο των αποδεικτικών προτάσεων που εξάγονται από τις περιλήψεις, δημιουργείται μια σύντομη περίληψη σχετικά με την παρέμβαση. Τέλος, οι περιλήψεις που παράγονται χρησιμοποιούνται για την εκπαίδευση ενός ταξινομητή με βάση το BERT, προκειμένου να συναχθεί η αποτελεσματικότητα μιας παρέμβασης. Για την αξιολόγηση της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου, εισάγουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που είναι μια συλλογή κλινικών δοκιμών μαζί με τα σχετικά άρθρα τους. Τα πειράματά μας, αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της παραγωγής σύντομων ενημερωτικών περιλήψεων και της χρήσης τους για την πρόβλεψη της αποτελεσματικότητας μιας παρέμβασης.', 'hu': 'A klinikai vizsgálatok alapvető lehetőséget kínálnak az új kezelések felfedezésére és az orvosi ismeretek fejlesztésére. A tárgyalás eredményének bizonytalansága azonban előre nem látható költségekhez és kudarcokhoz vezethet. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új módszert javasolunk egy beavatkozás hatékonyságának előrejelzésére egy klinikai vizsgálatban. Módszerünk a vizsgált beavatkozásról szóló szakirodalomban elérhető több dokumentumból tájékoztató összefoglaló készítésén alapul. Módszerünk konkrétan a beavatkozáshoz kapcsolódó PubMed cikkek összes absztraktját gyűjti össze. Ezután automatikusan kivonunk egy bizonyíték mondatot, amely információkat ad a beavatkozás hatékonyságáról. Az absztraktokból kivont bizonyítéki mondatok alapján rövid összefoglaló készül a beavatkozásról. Végezetül az elkészített összefoglalókat egy BERT-alapú osztályozó képzésére használják fel annak érdekében, hogy egy beavatkozás hatékonyságát következtesse. Javasolt módszerünk értékeléséhez új adatkészletet vezetünk be, amely klinikai vizsgálatok gyűjteményét tartalmazza a PubMed cikkekkel együtt. Kísérleteink bizonyítják, hogy milyen hatékony a rövid információs összefoglalók készítése és a beavatkozás hatékonyságának előrejelzése.', 'it': "Gli studi clinici offrono un'opportunità fondamentale per scoprire nuovi trattamenti e far progredire le conoscenze mediche. Tuttavia, l'incertezza dell'esito di un processo può portare a costi imprevisti e battute d'arresto. In questo studio, proponiamo un nuovo metodo per prevedere l'efficacia di un intervento in uno studio clinico. Il nostro metodo si basa sulla generazione di un riassunto informativo da più documenti disponibili in letteratura sull'intervento in studio. Nello specifico, il nostro metodo raccoglie prima tutti gli abstract degli articoli PubMed relativi all'intervento. Poi, una frase di prova, che trasmette informazioni sull'efficacia dell'intervento, viene estratta automaticamente da ogni abstract. Sulla base dell'insieme di frasi di prova estratte dagli abstract, viene costruito un breve riassunto sull'intervento. Infine, le sintesi prodotte vengono utilizzate per formare un classificatore basato sul BERT, al fine di dedurre l'efficacia di un intervento. Per valutare il nostro metodo proposto, introduciamo un nuovo dataset che è una raccolta di studi clinici insieme ai loro articoli associati PubMed. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano l'efficacia di produrre brevi riassunti informativi e utilizzarli per prevedere l'efficacia di un intervento.", 'ka': 'კლინიკური პროცემები უნდა ფუნდამეტური შესაძლებლობა აღმოჩენოთ ახალი მედიცინური მეცნიერები და განვითარება. მაგრამ, პროცესის შედეგების უცნობიერება შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ უცნობილი პასუხები და შეცდომილებები. ამ სწავლაში, ჩვენ ახალი მეტი დავიწყებთ კლინიკური პროცესში ინტერფექციის ეფექტიურობა. ჩვენი პროცემი დახმარებულია ინფორმაციური საზოგადომის შექმნაზე, რამდენიმე დოკუმენტებით, რომელიც ლიტერატურაში ხელხილდება ინტერვაციის განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი მეტი პირველი შეიძლება ყველა აბსტრაკტის პუბმედის ინტერვანციის შესახებ. შემდეგ, საკუთარი წესები, რომელიც ინტერფექციის ეფექტიურობის შესახებ ინფორმაციის შესახებ, ავტომატურად გამოყენება ყოველ აბსტრაქტიდან. აბსტრაკტებიდან გამოიყენებული წარმოდგენების ნაწილად, ინტერვანციის შესახებ კონფიგურაცია შექმნა. საბოლოოდ, გამოიყენებული საზოგადოებები გამოყენება BERT-ის კლასიფიკაციის განათლებისთვის, რომ ინტერვანციის ეფექტურობას გაგრძელებთ. ჩვენი წარმოიდგინული მეტი გავამუშაოთ, ჩვენ ახალი მონაცემების კოლენცია, რომელიც კლინიკური პროცემების კოლექცია ერთად იგივე დაკავშირებული PubMed წე ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, აჩვენებთ ძალიან ძალიან ეფექტიური ინფორმატიური საზოგადოებების გამოყენება და ისინი გამოყენება, რომ ინტერვანციის ეფექტიურობა', 'lt': 'Klinikiniai tyrimai suteikia pagrindinę galimybę rasti naujus gydymus ir tobulinti medicinines žinias. Tačiau dėl tyrimo rezultatų neapibrėžtumo gali atsirasti nenumatytos išlaidos ir nuostoliai. Šiame tyrime siūlome naują metodą, kuriuo būtų galima prognozuoti intervencijos veiksmingumą klinikiniame tyrime. Mūsų metodas grindžiamas informacinės santraukos sukūrimu iš daugelio literatūros dokumentų apie nagrinėjamą intervenciją. Konkrečiai, mūsų metodas pirmiausia surinka visus PubMed straipsnių, susijusių su intervencija, santraukas. Tada iš kiekvienos abstrakcijos automatiškai išimamas įrodymas, kuriame pateikiama informacija apie intervencijos veiksmingumą. Remiantis iš abstraktų gautais įrodymais, pateikiama trumpa intervencijos santrauka. Galiausiai parengtos santraukos naudojamos rengiant BERT grindžiamą klasifikatorių, siekiant nustatyti intervencijos veiksmingumą. Norėdami įvertinti mūsų siūlomą metodą, įvedame naują duomenų rinkinį, kuris yra klinikinių tyrimų rinkinys kartu su susijusiais PubMed straipsniais. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo trumpų informacinių santraukų rengimo veiksmingumą ir jų naudojimą intervencijos veiksmingumui prognozuoti.', 'mk': 'Клиничките процеси нудат основна можност да откријат нови лекови и да го унапредат медицинското знаење. Сепак, несигурноста на исходот од судењето може да доведе до непредвидени трошоци и несигурности. Во оваа студија, предложуваме нов метод за предвидување на ефикасноста на интервенцијата во клиничкиот процес. Our method relies on generating an informative summary from multiple documents available in the literature about the intervention under study.  Специфично, нашиот метод прво ги собира сите апстрактни статии од PubMed поврзани со интервенцијата. Потоа, доказна казна, која пренесува информации за ефективноста на интервенцијата, се извлекува автоматски од секој апстракт. Based on the set of evidence sentences extracted from the abstracts, a short summary about the intervention is constructed.  Конечно, произведените резултати се користат за обука на класификатор базиран на БЕРТ, со цел да се заклучи ефикасноста на интервенцијата. За да го процениме нашиот предложен метод, воведуваме нови податоци кои се колекција на клинички тестови заедно со нивните поврзани статии PubMed. Нашите експерименти ја демонстрираат ефикасноста на производството на кратки информативни резултати и нивното користење за да ја предвидат ефикасноста на интервенцијата.', 'ml': 'ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പുതിയ ചികിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുവാനും മെഡിക്കല്\u200d അറിവ് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാനും ഒരു അടിസ്ഥ എന്നാലും, ഒരു വിചാരണയുടെ ഫലത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഉറപ്പില്ലാത്തത് കാണാന്\u200d പറ്റുമെന്ന് തോന്നുന്നു. ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നാം ഒരു പുതിയ രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d വിചാരണയില്\u200d ഇടപെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ പ് ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് പഠിക്കുന്ന ഇടപാടിനെ സംബന്ധിച്ച് പല രേഖകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ആദ്യം പുബ്മെഡിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരവാദികളെല്ലാം കൂട്ടുന് പിന്നെ ഒരു തെളിവുകളുടെ വാക്ക്, അത് ഇടപെടുത്തുന്നതിനെ സംബന്ധിച്ചുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു, എല്ലാ അകല്\u200dച അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട തെളിവുകളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലാണ് ഈ ഇടപെടലിനെ  അവസാനം, ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഇടപാട നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് പരിശീലിക്കുന്നത് അവരുടെ ബന്ധ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d, ചുരുക്കം വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഉപയോഗിക്കു', 'mt': 'Il-provi kliniċi joffru opportunità fundamentali biex jinstabu trattamenti ġodda u jsir progress fl-għarfien mediku. Madankollu, l-inċertezza tar-riżultat ta’ prova tista’ twassal għal spejjeż u tfixkil mhux previsti. F’dan l-istudju, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid li jipprevedi l-effikaċja ta’ intervent fi prova klinika. Il-metodu tagħna jiddependi fuq il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ sommarju informativ minn diversi dokumenti disponibbli fil-letteratura dwar l-intervent li qed jiġi studjat. Specifically, our method first gathers all the abstracts of PubMed articles related to the intervention.  Imbagħad, sentenza ta’ evidenza, li tgħaddi informazzjoni dwar l-effettività tal-intervent, tiġi estratta awtomatikament minn kull astratt. Abbażi tas-sett ta’ sentenzi ta’ evidenza estratti mill-astratti, tinbena sommarju qasir dwar l-intervent. Fl-a ħħar nett, is-sommarji prodotti jintużaw għat-taħriġ ta’ klassifikatur ibbażat fuq il-BERT, sabiex tiġi konkluża l-effettività ta’ intervent. Biex tivvaluta l-metodu propost tagħna, a ħna nintroduċu sett ġdid ta’ dejta li huwa ġabra ta’ provi kliniċi flimkien mal-oġġetti assoċjati tagħhom PubMed. Our experiments, demonstrate the effectiveness of producing short informative summaries and using them to predict the effectiveness of an intervention.', 'kk': 'Клиникалық сынақтар жаңа лекцияларды табу және медицина білімдерін өзгерту үшін негізгі мүмкіндік береді. Бірақ, сынақтағы нәтижесінің тәуелсіздігі болуы мүмкін болады. Бұл зерттеулерде клиникалық сынақтағы аралас тәжірибесін бақылау үшін жаңа тәсілді таңдаймыз. Біздің әдіміміз зерттеулердің арасындағы бірнеше құжаттардан мәліметтік тұжырымдамасын құру үшін тәуелді. Әдетте, бірінші тәсіліміз PubMed мақалаларының абстрактарын біріктіреді. Содан кейін, әрбір абстрактан автоматты түрде бұл мәліметті түсіндіреді. Абстракттардан таратылған құлақтардың жиынына негізделген, аралас туралы қысқа тұжырымдама құрылады. Соңында жасалған тұжырымдары BERT негіздеген классификаторын оқыту үшін қолданылады. Біздің ұсынған әдімімізді бағалау үшін, олардың PubMed мақалаларымен бірге клиникалық сынақтар жинақтауы болатын жаңа деректер жинағын келтіреміз. Біздің тәжірибеміз, қысқа мәліметтік тәжірибелерді жасау және оларды қолдану үшін әсер ететін тәжірибелерді көрсетеді.', 'no': 'Kliniske prøver tilbyr ein grunnleggjande mulighet for å oppdaga nye behandlingar og forbetra medisinske kunnskap. Men usikkerheten på resultatet av ein prøv kan føre til ukjende kostnader og tilbakestillingar. I denne studien foreslår vi ein ny metode for å foreslå effektiviteten av ein intervensjon i ein klinisk prøv. Metoden vårt dependerer på å laga eit informativt samandrag frå fleire dokument som er tilgjengelege i literaturen om intervensjonen under studiering. Spesielt, metoden vårt først samler alle abstraktane av PubMed-artiklar som relaterte til intervensjonen. Deretter vert eit bevissetjing som gjev informasjon om effektiviteten av intervensjonen ekstrahert automatisk frå kvar abstrakt. Basert på settet av bevissetningar utpakka frå abstraktane, vert eit kort samandrag om intervensjonen konstruert. Til slutt vert dei produserte samandringane brukte for å trenja ein BERT-basert klassifiserer, for å gjera effektiviteten til ein intervensjon. For å evaluera vår foreslått metode, introduserer vi ein ny dataset som er samling av kliniske prøver sammen med sine tilknytte PubMed-artiklar. Eksperimentane våre, viser effektiviteten for å produsera kort informativt samandrag og bruka dei for å foregå effektiviteten av ein intervensjon.', 'pl': 'Badania kliniczne dają fundamentalną okazję do odkrycia nowych metod leczenia i poszerzenia wiedzy medycznej. Niepewność wyniku procesu może jednak prowadzić do nieprzewidzianych kosztów i niepowodzeń. W niniejszym badaniu proponujemy nową metodę przewidywania skuteczności interwencji w badaniu klinicznym. Nasza metoda polega na wygenerowaniu informacyjnego podsumowania z wielu dostępnych w literaturze dokumentów dotyczących badanej interwencji. W szczególności nasza metoda najpierw gromadzi wszystkie abstrakcje artykułów PubMed związanych z interwencją. Następnie z każdego abstraktu automatycznie wydobywa się zdanie dowodowe, które przekazuje informację o skuteczności interwencji. Na podstawie zestawu zdań dowodowych wyciągniętych z abstraktów skonstruowano krótkie podsumowanie interwencji. Wreszcie opracowane streszczenia są wykorzystywane do szkolenia klasyfikatora opartego na BERT, w celu wywnioskowania skuteczności interwencji. Aby ocenić proponowaną metodę, wprowadzamy nowy zestaw danych, który stanowi zbiór badań klinicznych wraz z powiązanymi z nimi artykułami PubMed. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują skuteczność tworzenia krótkich podsumowań informacyjnych i wykorzystania ich do przewidywania skuteczności interwencji.', 'mn': 'Эмнэлгийн судалгаанууд шинэ эмчилгээ олж, эмчилгээ мэдлэгийг хөгжүүлэх үндсэн боломж олгодог. Гэвч судалгааны үр дүний тодорхойгүй тодорхойгүй байдал болон нөлөөлдөг. Энэ судалгаанд бид клиникийн судалгаанд оролцооны үр дүнтэй байдлыг таамаглах шинэ арга зам санал өгдөг. Бидний арга нь судалгааны оролцооны тухай олон баримт бичсэн мэдээллийн жинхэнэ хэвлэлээс хамаарна. Ялангуяа бидний арга нь Пубмедийн бүх зүйлсийг цуглуулдаг. Дараа нь, харилцааны үр дүнтэй тухай мэдээллийг автоматжуулан автоматжуулдаг гэсэн үг. Абстрактаас гарсан баримтуудын өгүүлбэрүүдийн санаанд үндсэн бөгөөд оролцооны тухай богино тодорхойлолт бий болдог. Эцэст нь, бүтээгдэхүүний цуглуулга нь BERT-д суурилсан классификаторыг сургахын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн аргыг үнэлэхээр шинэ өгөгдлийн сангууд нь эмнэлгийн судалгааны цуглуулалт юм. Бидний туршилтууд богино мэдээллийн жишээг бүтээх үр дүнг харуулж, оролцооны үр дүнг тодорхойлдохын тулд ашигладаг.', 'ms': 'Ujian klinik menawarkan peluang dasar untuk menemukan rawatan baru dan mengembangkan pengetahuan perubatan. Namun, ketidakpastian hasil percubaan boleh menyebabkan biaya dan kemunduran yang tidak terduga. Dalam kajian ini, kami cadangkan kaedah baru untuk meramalkan kegunaan intervensi dalam ujian klinik. Our method relies on generating an informative summary from multiple documents available in the literature about the intervention under study.  Secara khusus, kaedah kita pertama mengumpulkan semua abstrak artikel PubMed berkaitan dengan intervensi. Kemudian, kalimat bukti, yang menyebarkan maklumat mengenai keefektivitas intervensi, dikeluarkan secara automatik dari setiap abstrak. Berdasarkan set kalimat bukti yang dikeluarkan dari abstrak, ringkasan pendek tentang intervensi dibina. Akhirnya, ringkasan yang dihasilkan digunakan untuk melatih pengklasifikasi berasaskan BERT, untuk menyimpulkan keefektivitas intervensi. Untuk menilai kaedah kami, kami memperkenalkan set data baru yang merupakan koleksi percubaan klinik bersama-sama dengan artikel PubMed yang berkaitan dengan mereka. Eksperimen kita, menunjukkan efektivitas menghasilkan ringkasan maklumat pendek dan menggunakannya untuk meramalkan efektivitas intervensi.', 'ro': 'Studiile clinice oferă o oportunitate fundamentală de a descoperi noi tratamente și de a avansa cunoștințele medicale. Cu toate acestea, incertitudinea rezultatului unui proces poate duce la costuri neprevăzute și eșecuri. În acest studiu, propunem o nouă metodă de prezicere a eficacității unei intervenții într-un studiu clinic. Metoda noastră se bazează pe generarea unui rezumat informativ din mai multe documente disponibile în literatura de specialitate despre intervenția studiată. Mai exact, metoda noastră colectează mai întâi toate rezumatele articolelor PubMed legate de intervenție. Apoi, o propoziție de probă, care transmite informații despre eficiența intervenției, este extrasă automat din fiecare rezumat. Pe baza setului de propoziții de probă extrase din rezumate, se construiește un scurt rezumat despre intervenție. În cele din urmă, rezumatele elaborate sunt utilizate pentru a instrui un clasificator bazat pe BERT, pentru a deduce eficacitatea unei intervenții. Pentru a evalua metoda propusă, introducem un nou set de date, care este o colecție de studii clinice împreună cu articolele asociate PubMed. Experimentele noastre demonstrează eficiența producerii scurte rezumate informative și utilizându-le pentru a prezice eficacitatea unei intervenții.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka hooyada iyo dhakhaatiirtu waxay bixiyaan fursado aasaasi ah in la ogaado daryeelka cusub iyo in la hormariyo aqoonta caafimaadka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee la’aanta dhamaadka baaritaanku wuxuu noqon karaa kharashka aan la arki karin iyo gadaalka. Waxbarashadan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab cusub si a an uga hor tagno shaqada qaabilaadda baaritaanka caafimaadka. Metalkeenu wuxuu ku xiran yahay ku sameynta summarin macluumaad ah oo laga helaa dukumentiyada kala duduwan ee warqadda ku saabsan heshiiska waxbarashada. Si gaar ah, qaabkeennu marka hore wuxuu soo ururiyaa dhamaan abstracta warqadaha PubMed ee la xiriira heshiiska. Markaas waxaa si automati ah looga soo saaraa qeyb, kaas oo wargelinta saameyn ku saabsan waxyaabaha heshiisiinka. Sida lagu saleynayo qeybaha sawirada ah oo laga soo bixiyey qalabka, waxaa la dhisaa summar gaaban oo ku saabsan heshiiska. Finally, the produced summaries are used to train a BERT-based classifier, in order to infer the effectiveness of an intervention.  Si aan u qiimeyno qaabkeenna la soo jeeday, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa sawir cusub oo lagu soo ururiyo baaritaanka dhakhaatiirta ee dhakhaatiirta ee la xiriira warqadaha PubMed. Imtixaankayada, waxay muujiyaan awoodda soo saarida summariyo gaaban oo macluumaad fudud iyo isticmaalka si ay uga hor tagto waxyaabaha heshiiska.', 'sr': 'Klinički ispitivanja nude osnovnu priliku da otkriju nove liječenje i unaprijedi medicinsko znanje. Međutim, nesigurnost ishoda suđenja može dovesti do nepredviđenih troškova i nevolja. U ovoj studiji predlažemo novu metodu da predvidimo učinkovitost intervencije u kliničkom ispitivanju. Naša metoda se oslanja na stvaranje informativnog sažetka iz mnogih dokumenta dostupnih u literaturi o intervenciji pod studijom. Posebno, naša metoda prvo okuplja sve apstrakte članaka PubMeda povezane sa intervencijom. Zatim, rečenica dokaza, koja prenosi informacije o učinkovitosti intervencije, se automatski izvlači iz svakog apstrakta. Na temelju set a dokaza izvučenih iz abstracta, napravljen je kratak sažetak o intervenciji. Konačno se proizvode sažetke koriste za obuku klasifikatora na BERT-u kako bi se zarazila učinkovitost intervencije. Da bi procenili našu predloženu metodu, predstavljamo novi set podataka koji je kolekcija kliničkih ispitivanja zajedno sa njihovim povezanim člancima PubMed a. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost proizvodnje kratkih informativnih sažetaka i koristiti ih kako bi predvidjeli učinkovitost intervencije.', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණාවල් අලුත් විද්\u200dයාවක් හොයාගන්න අවස්ථාවක් සහ වෛද්\u200dයාත්මක දන්න. නමුත්, පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් නිර්ශීතතාවක් පුළුවන් අනිවාර්යාත්මක විශාලයක් සහ අවස්ථ මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපි අළුත් විද්\u200dයාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙ අපේ විධානය විශ්වාස කරනවා අධ්\u200dයාපනයේ ඉන්න තොරතුරු සම්පතියක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ පළමු විධානය පුබ්මෙඩ් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විධානය සම්බන්ධ විධානය කරනවා. ඊට පස්සේ, සාක්ෂි වාක්ෂාවක්, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙ සාක්ෂික වාක්ෂාවන්ගේ සූදානම් සම්බන්ධයෙන් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳින් තියෙන්නේ, අවස්ථාව ගැන ක අන්තිමේදි, උත්පාදනය කරපු සංශ්\u200dය භාවිතා වෙනවා BERT-අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂකයෙක් කිරීම සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා  අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි අළුත් දත්ත සෙට් එකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් පුළුවන් සමග ප්\u200dරශ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය, පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න පුළුවන් සහ ඔවුන්ව භාවිතා කරන', 'ta': 'சில சோதனைகள் புதிய சிகிச்சைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு அடிப்படையான வாய்ப்பு கொடுக்கிறது மற்றும் மருத்துவ அறி ஆனால், சோதனையின் முடிவின் உறுதியில்லை என்றாலும் தெரியாத செலவு மற்றும் தடை செய்ய முடியும். இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் ஒரு சில சோதனையில் ஒரு இடைவெளியின் விளைவை மு எங்கள் முறைமை படிக்கும் இடைவெளியை பற்றி பல ஆவணங்களில் இருந்து ஒரு தகவல் சுருக்கம் உருவாக்குவதை நம்புகிறது. குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் முறைமையில் முதலில் பூப்மெட் கட்டுரைகள் அனைத்தையும் தொகுக்கும் இடைவெளியில் தொடர்ப பின்னர், ஒரு தெளிவான வாக்கியம், அது இடைவெளியின் விளைவை பற்றிய தகவலை கூறுகிறது, ஒவ்வொரு ஒதுக்கீட்டிலிருந்தும் தா வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட தெளிவான வாக்குகள் அமைப்பு அடிப்படையில், இடைவெளியேறும் ஒரு சிறிய சுருக்கம் கட்டப்பட்டது. இறுதியில், உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சுருக்குகள் ஒரு BERT-அடிப்படையில் வகுப்பாளரை பயிற்சி செய்ய பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, ஒரு இடைவெளியின எங்கள் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறையை மதிப்பீடு செய்வதற்கு, நாம் புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது சில சோதனைகளின் சேகரிக எங்கள் சோதனைகள், சிறிய தகவல் சுருக்கத்தை உருவாக்கும் விளைவுகளை காட்டுகிறது மற்றும் அவற்றை பயன்படுத்தி இடைவெளியின் விளை', 'ur': 'کلینیکی آزمائش نے نئی درمانی کا پیدا کرنے اور پزشکی علم کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے ایک بنیادی فرصت دے دی ہے. لیکن ایک آزمائش کے نتائج کا یقیناً غیر منتظر قیمت اور تکلیف کی وجہ سے پہنچا سکتا ہے۔ اس مطالعہ میں ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ ایک کلینیکی امتحان میں ایک مطالعہ کی فعالیت کی پیش کرو۔ ہمارا طریقہ تعلیم کے ذریعہ مطالعہ کے بارے میں مطالعہ کے بارے میں بہت سی دفتروں میں موجود ہونے کے ذریعہ ایک معلومات کی تعلیم پیدا کرنے پر ہے. خاص طور پر، ہمارا طریقہ پہلی بار PubMed کے تمام مخلوقات کو جمع کرتا ہے جن کے معاملہ میں مربوط ہے. پھر ایک دلیل فیصلہ، جس کی اطلاعات کے بارے میں اضافہ کرتی ہے، ہر دفعہ سے اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ ابتراکٹوں سے نکالے ہوئے دلیل جماعتوں کے سٹے پر بنیاد ہے، انٹرنیٹ کے بارے میں ایک چھوٹی جماعت بنائی جاتی ہے. آخر میں، پیدا کئے گئے سامنے ایک BERT-based classifier کی تطارین کرنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، تاکہ ایک intervention کے فعالیت کو کمزور کرے. ہمارے مقرر کردہ طریقے کا ارزش کرنا، ہم نے ایک نوی ڈاٹ سٹ کو معلوم کرلیا ہے جو ان کے مشترک PubMed معلومات کے ساتھ کلینیکی آزمائش کا ایک جمع ہے. ہماری آزمائش، تھوڑے معلومات کے سامنے پیدا کرنے کے مطابق دکھائے جاتے ہیں اور ان سے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ان کے مطابق ایک انفجار کے مطابق پیش کریں.', 'sv': 'Kliniska prövningar erbjuder en grundläggande möjlighet att upptäcka nya behandlingar och utveckla den medicinska kunskapen. Osäkerheten kring resultatet av en rättegång kan dock leda till oförutsedda kostnader och bakslag. I denna studie föreslår vi en ny metod för att förutsäga effektiviteten av en intervention i en klinisk prövning. Vår metod bygger på att generera en informativ sammanfattning från flera dokument som finns tillgängliga i litteraturen om interventionen under studien. Specifikt samlar vår metod först alla abstracts av PubMed artiklar relaterade till interventionen. Därefter extraheras en bevisuppgift, som förmedlar information om interventionens effektivitet, automatiskt från varje abstrakt. Utifrån den uppsättning evidensmeningar som extraheras ur abstrakten konstrueras en kort sammanfattning av interventionen. Slutligen används de sammanställda sammanfattningarna för att utbilda en BERT-baserad klassificerare för att dra slutsatsen om en intervention är effektiv. För att utvärdera vår föreslagna metod introducerar vi ett nytt dataset som är en samling kliniska prövningar tillsammans med tillhörande PubMed artiklar. Våra experiment visar hur effektivt det är att producera korta informativa sammanfattningar och använda dem för att förutsäga effektiviteten av en intervention.', 'uz': "Klinistik tizimlari yangi tizimlarni topish va tibbiy ta'tibor berish uchun asosiy imkoniyat beradi. Lekin, tizimning natijasi haqiqatgina kutilmagan narsalar va tizimlar sababchi bo'ladi. Bu o'qituvda, biz taqdimot davomida intervention effektini oldin yangi usulni taqdimiz. Bizning usulida o'qindilar davomida intervention haqida bir nechta hujjatdagi maʼlumot hisobotini yaratishga ishlatadi. Ko'rsatilgan, bizning usuli birinchi marta intervention bilan hamma PubMed maqolalarning abstraktlarini тўплайди. Keyin, intervention effektining haqida maʼlumotni anglatadi, har bir avtomatik avtomatik ravishda olib tashlanadi. Avraktlar tashkilotlaridan tashlangan hujjatlar soni asosida, intervention haqida qisqa muhtasi yaratiladi. Endi, tuzilgan qismlarni BERT asosida tizimga tahrirlash uchun ishlatiladi, intervention effektini kamaytirish uchun. Ko'rib chiqarish uchun, biz yangi maʼlumotlar setini aniqlamiz. Bu taʼminlovchi tajribalarning boshqa bog'liq PubMed maqolalari bilan birlashtirish. Bizning tajribalarimiz, qisqa maʼlumot qisqartmalarni yaratishning effektini ko'rsatadi va ularni intervention effektini kutish uchun ishlatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Thử nghiệm lâm sàng là cơ hội cơ bản để khám phá các phương pháp mới và nâng cao kiến thức y học. Tuy nhiên, sự không chắc chắn về kết quả của một thử nghiệm có thể dẫn đến chi phí và thất bại bất ngờ. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để dự đoán hiệu quả của sự can thiệp trong thử nghiệm lâm sàng. Phương pháp của chúng tôi dựa trên việc tạo ra một bản tóm tắt thông tin từ nhiều tài liệu có trong văn học về sự can thiệp đang được nghiên cứu. Cụ thể, phương pháp này thu thập trước hết các tổng thu thập các bản trừu tượng liên quan đến sự can thiệp. Rồi, một câu chứng cứ, cung cấp thông tin về hiệu quả của cuộc can thiệp, được tự động trích ra từ mỗi trừu tượng. Dựa trên tập hợp bằng chứng trích ra từ bản trừu tượng, nó được dựng lên một bản tóm tắt ngắn về sự can thiệp. Cuối cùng, những kiểm pháp được dùng để huấn luyện một nhà phân phân loại quý khoa BERT, để đoán ra sự hiệu quả của việc can thiệp. Để đánh giá phương pháp chúng tôi đề nghị, chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu một tập tin mới, một tập hợp các thử nghiệm lâm sàng cùng với các bài tập PubMed của chúng. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi, chứng minh hiệu quả của việc cung cấp ngắn và sử dụng chúng để dự đoán hiệu quả của sự can thiệp.', 'bg': 'Клиничните изпитвания предлагат фундаментална възможност за откриване на нови лечения и напредване на медицинските знания. Въпреки това, несигурността относно резултатите от процеса може да доведе до непредвидени разходи и неуспехи. В това проучване предлагаме нов метод за прогнозиране на ефективността на интервенция в клинично изпитване. Нашият метод разчита на генерирането на информативно резюме от множество налични в литературата документи за изследваната интервенция. По-конкретно, методът ни първо събира всички резюмета на статиите, свързани с интервенцията. След това автоматично се извлича доказателствено изречение, което предава информация за ефективността на интервенцията. Въз основа на набор от доказателствени изречения, извлечени от резюметата, се конструира кратко резюме за интервенцията. Накрая, изготвените резюмета се използват за обучение на класификатор, базиран на BERT, за да се направи извод за ефективността на интервенцията. За да оценим предложения метод, ние въвеждаме нов набор от данни, който представлява колекция от клинични изпитвания заедно с свързаните с тях статии. Нашите експерименти демонстрират ефективността на изготвянето на кратки информативни резюмета и използването им за предсказване на ефективността на интервенцията.', 'da': 'Kliniske forsøg giver en grundlæggende mulighed for at opdage nye behandlinger og fremme den medicinske viden. Men usikkerheden om resultatet af en forsøg kan føre til uforudsete omkostninger og tilbageslag. I dette studie foreslår vi en ny metode til at forudsige effektiviteten af en intervention i et klinisk forsøg. Vores metode er baseret på at generere et informativt resumé ud fra flere dokumenter tilgængelige i litteraturen om den undersøgte intervention. Specielt samler vores metode først alle abstracts af PubMed artikler relateret til interventionen. Derefter udtrækkes en bevissætning, som formidler oplysninger om effektiviteten af interventionen, automatisk fra hvert abstrakt. Med udgangspunkt i sættet af bevissætninger udvundet fra abstrakterne konstrueres et kort resumé af interventionen. Endelig bruges de udarbejdede resuméer til at uddanne en BERT-baseret klassificering for at udlede effektiviteten af en intervention. For at evaluere vores foreslåede metode introducerer vi et nyt datasæt, som er en samling af kliniske forsøg sammen med deres tilknyttede PubMed artikler. Vores eksperimenter viser effektiviteten af at udarbejde korte informative resuméer og bruge dem til at forudsige effektiviteten af en intervention.', 'nl': 'Klinische studies bieden een fundamentele kans om nieuwe behandelingen te ontdekken en de medische kennis te verbeteren. De onzekerheid over de uitkomst van een proces kan echter leiden tot onvoorziene kosten en tegenslagen. In dit onderzoek stellen we een nieuwe methode voor om de effectiviteit van een interventie in een klinisch onderzoek te voorspellen. Onze methode is gebaseerd op het genereren van een informatieve samenvatting uit meerdere documenten die beschikbaar zijn in de literatuur over de onderzochte interventie. Specifiek, onze methode verzamelt eerst alle abstracts van PubMed artikelen gerelateerd aan de interventie. Vervolgens wordt uit elk abstract automatisch een bewijszin gehaald, die informatie over de effectiviteit van de interventie overbrengt. Op basis van de reeks bewijszinnen uit de samenvattingen wordt een korte samenvatting over de interventie geconstrueerd. Ten slotte worden de gepresenteerde samenvattingen gebruikt om een op BERT gebaseerde classificator te trainen, om de effectiviteit van een interventie te bepalen. Om onze voorgestelde methode te evalueren, introduceren we een nieuwe dataset, een verzameling klinische studies samen met de bijbehorende PubMed artikelen. Onze experimenten tonen de effectiviteit aan van het maken van korte informatieve samenvattingen en het gebruik ervan om de effectiviteit van een interventie te voorspellen.', 'hr': 'Klinički ispitivanja nude osnovnu priliku otkrivanja novih liječenja i unaprijeđivanja medicinskih znanja. Međutim, nesigurnost rezultata suđenja može dovesti do nepredvidnih troškova i neugodnosti. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo novu metodu predviđanja učinkovitosti intervencije u kliničkom ispitivanju. Naša metoda se oslanja na stvaranje informativnog sažetka iz višestrukih dokumenta dostupnih u književnosti o intervenciji pod ispitivanjem. Posebno, naša metoda prvo okuplja sve apstrakte članaka PubMeda povezane s intervencijom. Onda, kazna dokaza, koja prenosi informacije o učinkovitosti intervencije, automatski se izvlači iz svakog apstrakta. Na temelju kompleta dokaza izvlačenih iz abstracta, napravljen je kratak sažetak o intervenciji. Konačno se proizvode sažetke koriste za obuku klasifikatora baziranog na BERT-u kako bi se zarazila učinkovitost intervencije. Da bi procijenili našu predloženu metodu, predstavljamo novi set podataka koji je skupljanje kliničkih ispitivanja zajedno s njihovim povezanim člancima PubMed a. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost proizvodnje kratkih informativnih sažetaka i koristiti ih kako bi predvidjeli učinkovitost intervencije.', 'ko': '임상시험은 새로운 치료 방법을 발견하고 의학 지식을 향상시키는 데 기본적인 기회를 제공했다.그러나 실험 결과의 불확실성은 예견할 수 없는 원가와 좌절을 초래할 수 있다.이 연구에서 우리는 임상시험에서의 개입 조치의 유효성을 예측하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 문헌에서 연구에 관여하는 여러 문서에서 정보적 요약을 생성하는 데 의존한다.구체적으로 말하자면, 우리의 방법은 우선 관여와 관련된 PubMed 문장의 모든 요약을 수집한다.그리고 각 요약에서 자동으로 증거문을 추출하여 관여의 유효성에 대한 정보를 전달한다.요약에서 추출한 증거문에 근거하여 관여에 관한 간단한 요약을 구축하였다.마지막으로 생성된 요약은 버트에 기반한 분류기를 훈련시켜 관여의 유효성을 추정하는 데 사용된다.우리가 제시한 방법을 평가하기 위해 임상시험 및 관련 PubMed 기사의 집합인 새로운 데이터 세트를 도입했습니다.우리의 실험은 간단한 정보 요약을 생성하고 이를 이용하여 관여 효과를 예측하는 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'de': 'Klinische Studien bieten eine grundlegende Gelegenheit, neue Behandlungen zu entdecken und das medizinische Wissen weiterzuentwickeln. Die Unsicherheit über den Ausgang eines Verfahrens kann jedoch zu unvorhergesehenen Kosten und Rückschlägen führen. In dieser Studie schlagen wir eine neue Methode vor, um die Wirksamkeit einer Intervention in einer klinischen Studie vorherzusagen. Unsere Methode basiert auf der Generierung einer informativen Zusammenfassung aus mehreren in der Literatur verfügbaren Dokumenten über die zu untersuchende Intervention. Insbesondere sammelt unsere Methode zunächst alle Abstracts von PubMed Artikeln, die mit der Intervention zusammenhängen. Dann wird aus jedem Abstract automatisch ein Beweissatz extrahiert, der Informationen über die Wirksamkeit der Intervention vermittelt. Basierend auf den aus den Abstracts extrahierten Beweissätzen wird eine kurze Zusammenfassung der Intervention erstellt. Schließlich werden die erstellten Zusammenfassungen verwendet, um einen BERT-basierten Klassifikator zu trainieren, um die Effektivität einer Intervention zu bestimmen. Um unsere vorgeschlagene Methode zu evaluieren, führen wir einen neuen Datensatz ein, der eine Sammlung klinischer Studien zusammen mit den zugehörigen PubMed Artikeln ist. Unsere Experimente zeigen, wie effektiv es ist, kurze informative Zusammenfassungen zu erstellen und daraus die Wirksamkeit einer Intervention vorherzusagen.', 'id': 'Ujian klinis menawarkan kesempatan dasar untuk menemukan pengobatan baru dan meningkatkan pengetahuan medis. Namun, ketidakpastian tentang hasil percobaan bisa menyebabkan biaya yang tidak terduga dan kemunduran. Dalam studi ini, kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk memprediksikan efektif intervensi dalam ujian klinis. Our method relies on generating an informative summary from multiple documents available in the literature about the intervention under study.  Secara spesifik, metode kita pertama mengumpulkan semua abstrak artikel PubMed yang berhubungan dengan intervensi. Kemudian, kalimat bukti, yang menyebarkan informasi tentang efektivitas intervensi, secara otomatis dikeluarkan dari setiap abstrak. Berdasarkan set kalimat bukti yang dikeluarkan dari abstrak, ringkasan singkat tentang intervensi dibangun. Akhirnya, ringkasan yang diproduksi digunakan untuk melatih klasifikasi berdasarkan BERT, untuk menyimpulkan efektivitas intervensi. Untuk mengevaluasi metode kami yang diusulkan, kami memperkenalkan set data baru yang merupakan koleksi percobaan klinis bersama dengan artikel PubMed yang mereka persekutukan. Eksperimen kita, menunjukkan efektivitas produksi ringkasan informatif pendek dan menggunakannya untuk memprediksi efektivitas intervensi.', 'fa': 'آزمایشات کلینیکی فرصت بنیادی برای کشف درمان های جدید و پیشرفت دانش پزشکی پیشنهاد می دهد. ولی مطمئنی نتیجه یک آزمایش می\u200cتواند به هزینه\u200cهای غیر پیش\u200cبینی و تباهی برساند. در این مطالعه، ما یک روش جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا تاثیر اجرایی در یک امتحان کلینیک را پیش بینی کنیم. روش ما به تولید یک جمع اطلاعاتی از مدارک چندین دسترسی در ادبیات درباره مدارک تحقیق بستگی دارد. دقیقاً روش ما اولین بار تمام معجزه\u200cهای PubMed را در ارتباط با intervention جمع می\u200cکند. سپس، یک جمله مدرک، که اطلاعات درباره موثرت مدارک را می\u200cفرستد، از هر دفعه اخراج می\u200cشود. بر اساس مجموعه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cهای مدرک که از آب\u200cتراکت\u200cها خارج شده\u200cاند، یک جمله کوتاه در مورد مدرک ساخته می\u200cشود. بالاخره، جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای تولید شده برای آموزش گروه\u200cکننده بر بنیاد BERT استفاده می\u200cشود، برای تأثیر فعالیت یک intervention. برای ارزیابی روش پیشنهاد ما، یک مجموعه داده جدید را معرفی می کنیم که یک مجموعه از آزمایشات کلینیک با مقاله های PubMed مربوط به آنها است. آزمایشات ما، موثرت تولید جمعیت های اطلاعات کوتاه را نشان می دهد و از آنها استفاده می کنند تا پیش بینی موثرت یک مدارک را پیش بینی کنند.', 'af': "Kliniske probeerings offer a fundamental opportunity to discover new treatments and advance the medical knowledge. Maar die onbevestigheid van die uitgaande van 'n probeer kan lei na onverwagte koste en opstandings. In hierdie studie voorstel ons 'n nuwe metode om die effektiviteit van 'n intervensie in 'n kliniske probeer te voorskou. Ons metode verlig op die genereer van 'n informatiewe opsomming van veelvuldige dokumente wat beskikbaar is in die literaat oor die intervensie onder studie. Spesifieke, ons metode versamel eerste alle abstrakte van PubMed-artikels wat verwante met die intervensie. Dan word 'n bevestig setsing, wat inligting oor die effektiviteit van die intervensie uitgevoer, automaties van elke abstrak uitgevoer. Op die stel van getuienisse wat uit die abstrakte uitgevoer is, word 'n kort opsomming oor die intervensie gebruik. Eindelik word die geproduseerde opsommings gebruik om 'n BERT-gebaseerde klassifiseerder te tref, om die effektiviteit van 'n intervensie te verwyder. Om ons voorgestelde metode te evalueer, introduseer ons 'n nuwe datastel wat 'n versameling van kliniske probeers saam met hulle geassosieerde PubMed artikels. Ons eksperimente, wys die effektiviteit van die produksie van kort informatiewe opsommings en gebruik hulle om die effektiviteit van 'n intervensie te voorskou.", 'sq': 'Provat klinike ofrojnë një mundësi thelbësore për të zbuluar trajtime të reja dhe për të përparuar njohuritë mjekësore. Megjithatë, pasiguria e përfundimit të një gjyqi mund të çojë në kosto e papritura dhe prapa. Në këtë studim, propozojmë një metodë të re për të parashikuar efektshmërinë e një ndërhyrjeje në një provë klinike. Metoda jonë mbështetet në gjenerimin e një përmbledhjeje informative nga dokumente të shumta në dispozicion në letër rreth ndërhyrjes në studim. Veçanërisht, metoda jonë së pari mbledh të gjitha abstraktat e artikujve të PubMed lidhur me ndërhyrjen. Pastaj, një dënim provash, i cili transmeton informacion rreth efektshmërisë së ndërhyrjes, nxirret automatikisht nga çdo abstrakt. Bazuar në sërën e dënimeve të provave të nxjerra nga abstraktet, ndërtohet një përmbledhje e shkurtër rreth ndërhyrjes. Më në fund, përmbledhjet e prodhuara përdoren për të trajnuar një klasifikues me bazë në BERT, me qëllim që të përfundojë efektshmëria e një ndërhyrje. To evaluate our proposed method, we introduce a new dataset which is a collection of clinical trials together with their associated PubMed articles.  Eksperimentet tona, demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e prodhimit të përmbledhjeve të shkurtra informative dhe përdorimit të tyre për të parashikuar efektshmërinë e një ndërhyrjeje.', 'tr': 'Klinikler täze ilatyny tapmak we lukmanyň bilimi öňünden geçirmek üçin esasy bir mümkinçilik teklip berýärler. Ýöne, synagyň netijeleriniň kesinlikligi garaşylmadyk tölegi we netijeleri bolup biler. Bu araşdyrmada, kliniki barlamada täsirleşik guralygyny tahmin etmek üçin täze bir yöntem teklip edýäris. Biziň ýüregimiz öwrenmek üçin edebiýatynda bolan ýagdaý senediň esasy barada informasiýa toplanty döretmäge mümkin edýär. Adatça, biziň täzimiz ilkinji gezek PubMed sanlarynyň çykyşlaryny çykýar. Soňra, bir kanlag sözlemi, intervenciň etkinliýeti barada maglumatlary üýtgeden, her abstraktan öz-özüne çykarylýar. Subtractlardan çykalan şahada sözlerine daýanýar, olar hakynda gysga topar guruldy. Soňunda, üretilen toparlar BERT tabanly klasifikatçy öwretmek üçin ulanylýar, bir aralygy etkinleşendirmek üçin. Öň tekliplerimizi çözmek üçin, täze bir veri setirini, bu kitaby PubMed makalary bilen birlikte kliniki synaglaryň çykarmagydyr. Biziň deneylerimiz, gysga informatyýa toparlaryň etkinliğini görkez we olaryň ulaganyň etkinliğini çaklamak üçin ulanýarys.', 'sw': 'Mashitaka ya kitabibu yanatoa fursa ya msingi ya kutambua matibabu mpya na kukuza maarifa ya afya. Hata hivyo, usio na uhakika wa matokeo ya mashitaka yanaweza kusababisha gharama na vikwazo visivyoonekana. Katika utafiti huu, tunapendekeza njia mpya ya kutabiri ufanisi wa kuingilia kwenye mashitaka ya kliniki. Utawala wetu unategemea kutengeneza muhtasari wa taarifa kutoka katika nyaraka kadhaa zinazopatikana katika fasihi kuhusu kuingilia wakati wa utafiti. Kwa hakika, njia yetu ya kwanza inakusanya matokeo yote ya makala za PubMed yanayohusiana na kuingilia kati. Kisha, hukumu ya ushahidi, ambayo inaonyesha taarifa kuhusu ufanisi wa kuingilia kati, inaondolewa kwa wenyewe kutoka kwa kila ubaguzi. Kwa mujibu wa seti ya hukumu za ushahidi zilizotolewa kutoka kwenye vizuizi hivyo, muhtasari mfupi kuhusu kuingilia kati umetengenezwa. Mwisho, kiangazi kilichotengenezwa kinatumiwa kufundisha mfanyakazi anayeishi BERT, ili kupunguza ufanisi wa kuingilia kati. Ili kutathmini mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa, tunaanzisha kituo kipya cha taarifa ambacho ni mkusanyiko wa majaribio ya kliniki pamoja na makala zao zinazohusiana na PubMed. Majaribio yetu, yanaonyesha ufanisi wa kutengeneza muhtasari mfupi wa habari na kutumia hizo kutabiri ufanisi wa kuingilia kati.', 'am': 'የኪኪሎን ፈተናዎች አዲስ ጥቃቄን ለማግኘት እና የጥምቀት እውቀትን ለመቀበል የመሠረት ዕቃን አቀረቡ፡፡ ነገር ግን የፈተናው ፍጻሜ ፍጻሜ ሳይታወቅ ዋጋና ጥላቻ ሊመራ ይችላል። በዚህ ትምህርት፣ በቻሎኒካዊ ፈተና ውስጥ የመግባትን ውጤት ለመግለጥ አዲስ ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በጽሕፈት ውስጥ በተማርኩት ውስጥ የሚደረገውን የመረጃ አዋጅ ማውጣትን በመፍጠር ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ የፊታችን ሥርዓት መጀመሪያ የፉብሜድ ጽሑፎችን ሁሉ ለመስማት ነው፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የስርዓት ውይይት የሚወስደውን የመስረጃ ውይይት ከሁሉም ውጤት በራስነት ይወስዳል፡፡ ከሥርዓት የተወጡትን ምስክር ቃላት በተደረገ ቁጥጥር የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻው የደረገው ጉዳዩ የBERT-based ክፍላፊዎችን ለማስተማር ይጠቀማል፡፡ በተዘጋጀ ሥርዓታችንን ለማስተዋል፣ አዲስ ዳታዎችን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ Our experiments, demonstrate the effectiveness of producing short informative summaries and using them to predict the effectiveness of an intervention.', 'hy': 'Կլինիկական փորձարկումները հնարավորություն են տալիս նոր բուժումներ հայտնաբերելու և բժշկական գիտելիքներ զարգացնելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, փորձարկումների արդյունքի անորոշությունը կարող է հանգեցնել անկանխատեսված արժեքների և անհաջողությունների: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ կանխատեսելու միջամտելու արդյունավետությունը կլինիկական ուսումնասիրության մեջ: Մեր մեթոդը հիմնված է ուսումնասիրության ընդմիջման մասին բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերից տեղեկատվական համառոտագրության ստեղծման վրա: Մասնավորապես, մեր մեթոդը առաջին անգամ հավաքում է բոլոր կառուցվածքները, որոնք կապված են միջամտության հետ: Then, an evidence sentence, which conveys information about the effectiveness of the intervention, is extracted automatically from each abstract.  Հաշվի առնելով վերացածներից ստացված ապացույցների նախադասությունների շարքին, կառուցվում է միջամտելու կարճ համառոտագրություն: Վերջապես, արտադրված համառոտագրությունները օգտագործվում են BER-ի հիմնված դասակարգիչ վարժեցնելու համար, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք ներխուժման արդյունավետությունը: Մեր առաջարկած մեթոդը գնահատելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր տվյալների համակարգ, որը կլինիկական փորձարկումների հավաքածուն է միասին նրանց կապված Պուբմեդի հոդվածների հետ: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս կարճ տեղեկատվական համառոտագրությունների արդյունավետությունը և դրանք օգտագործում են միջամտելու արդյունավետության կանխատեսման համար:', 'bn': 'ক্লিনিক্যাল বিচার নতুন চিকিৎসা আবিষ্কার এবং চিকিৎসা জ্ঞানের উন্নতি প্রদান করার মৌলিক সুযোগ প্রদান করে। তবে বিচারের ফলাফলের নিশ্চিতভাবে অদৃশ্য খরচ এবং পিছনের দিকে যেতে পারে। এই গবেষণায় আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে একটি ক্লিনিকিয়াল বিচারে হস্তক্ষেপের কার্যক্রম ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা। Our method relies on generating an informative summary from multiple documents available in the literature about the intervention under study.  বিশেষ করে, আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রথমে পুবেমেদের প্রতিবেদনের সাথে সম্পর্কিত প্রতিবেদনের সব অস্বীকৃতি জমা করে। তারপর একটি প্রমাণের বাক্য, যা এই হস্তক্ষেপের কার্যকলাপ সম্পর্কে তথ্য প্রকাশ করে, স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রত্যেক উপেক্ষা থেক বিভিন্ন প্রমাণের সংক্ষেপের ভিত্তিতে এই হস্তক্ষেপ নির্মাণ করা হয়েছে। শেষ পর্যন্ত উৎপাদনের সারসংক্ষেপ বিআরটি-ভিত্তিক শ্রেণীকে প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়, যাতে একটি হস্তক্ষেপের কার্যকরী আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিকে মূল্যায়নের জন্য আমরা একটি নতুন ডাটাসেট পরিচালনা করি যা তাদের সঙ্গে যুক্ত পুবেমেদের প্রবন্ধের সাথ আমাদের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে, সংক্ষিপ্ত তথ্য সংক্ষেপ তৈরি করার কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে এবং তাদের ব্যবহার করে একটি হস্তক্ষেপের কার', 'ca': "Els exàmens clínics ofereixen una oportunitat fonamental per descobrir nous tractaments i avançar el coneixement mèdic. Tot i així, l'incertesa dels resultats d'un procés pot portar a costos i inconvenients imprevistos. En aquest estudi, proposem un nou mètode per predir l'eficacia d'una intervenció en un assaig clínic. El nostre mètode es basa en generar un resum informatiu a partir de múltiples documents disponibles a la literatura sobre l'intervenció estudiada. Concretament, el nostre mètode recolliu primer tots els abstracts d'articles de PubMed relacionats amb l'intervenció. Llavors, una frase d'evidència, que transmet informació sobre l'eficacia de l'intervenció, es extrau automàticament de cada abstract. Sobre la base del conjunt de frases d'evidència extraïdes dels abstracts, es construeix un resum curt sobre l'intervenció. Finalment, els resums produïts s'utilitzen per formar un classificador basat en BERT, per deduir l'eficacia d'una intervenció. Per avaluar el nostre mètode proposat, introduim un nou conjunt de dades que és una col·lecció d'exàmens clínics juntament amb els seus articles associats de PubMed. Els nostres experiments demostren l'eficacia de produir resumes informatius curts i utilitzar-los per predir l'eficacia d'una intervenció.", 'az': 'Kliniki sınaqlar yeni tedaviləri keçmək və təhsil elmi öyrənmək üçün əsas fırsatı təklif edir. Lakin, imtahanın sonuçlarının inkar edilməsi gözlənilməmiş maliyyətlərə və çətinliklərə yol göstərə bilər. Bu təcrübədə kliniki sınaqda bir intervencinin etkinliğini təcrübə etmək üçün yeni bir metod təklif edirik. Bizim metodumuz təhsil ediləcək intervenci haqqında çoxlu məlumatlardan istifadə edilən informativ toplamı yaratmağa təvəkkül edir. Özellikle, bizim metodumuz ilk dəfə PubMed maddələrinin bütün abstraktlarını intervenciyə bağlı toplayır. Sonra, intervencinin etkinlik haqqında məlumatları bildirən bir dəlil cümləsi hər bir abstraktan avtomatik olaraq çıxarılır. Abstraktlardan çıxarılan dəlil cümlələrinin qurduğuna görə, intervenci haqqında qısa bir summary inşa edilir. Sonunda, ürəklənmiş toplamlar BERT tabanlı klasifikatçısını təhsil etmək üçün istifadə edilirlər. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz metodumuzu değerləşdirmək üçün yeni verilən qurğunu təşkil edirik ki, bu, onların əlaqəsi olan PubMed maddələri ilə birlikdə klinik sınaqların koleksiyonudur. Bizim təcrübələrimiz, qısa informativ toplamları ürəklənmək və intervencinin etkinliğini öyrənmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün təcrübələrimizi göstər.', 'cs': 'Klinické studie nabízejí základní příležitost objevit nové léčby a rozšířit lékařské znalosti. Nejistota výsledku procesu však může vést k nepředvídaným nákladům a neúspěchům. V této studii navrhujeme novou metodu predikce účinnosti intervence v klinickém hodnocení. Naše metoda spočívá na vytvoření informativního shrnutí z několika dokumentů dostupných v literatuře o zkoumané intervenci. Konkrétně naše metoda nejprve shromažďuje veškeré abstrakty článků PubMed souvisejících s intervencí. Z každého abstraktu se pak automaticky extrahuje důkazní věta, která přináší informace o účinnosti intervence. Na základě souboru důkazních vět extrahovaných z abstraktů je sestaveno krátké shrnutí o intervenci. Na závěr jsou vytvořené souhrny použity k výcviku klasifikátoru založeného na BERT s cílem odvodit účinnost intervence. Pro zhodnocení naší navrhované metody představujeme nový datový soubor, který je souborem klinických studií spolu s jejich příslušnými články PubMed. Naše experimenty demonstrují efektivitu vytváření krátkých informačních shrnutí a jejich použití k předpovědi efektivity intervence.', 'bs': 'Klinički ispitivanja nude osnovnu priliku da otkriju nove liječenje i unaprijedi medicinsko znanje. Međutim, nesigurnost ishoda suđenja može dovesti do nepredviđenih troškova i nevolja. U ovom ispitivanju predlažemo novu metodu predviđanja učinkovitosti intervencije u kliničkom ispitivanju. Naša metoda se oslanja na stvaranje informativnog sažetka iz mnogih dokumenta dostupnih u književnosti o intervenciji pod studijom. Posebno, naša metoda prvo okuplja sve apstrakte članaka PubMeda povezane sa intervencijom. Onda, kazna dokaza, koja prenosi informacije o učinkovitosti intervencije, automatski se izvlači iz svakog apstrakta. Na temelju set a dokaza izvučenih iz abstracta, napravljen je kratak sažetak o intervenciji. Konačno se proizvode sažetke koriste za obuku klasifikatora na BERT-u kako bi se zarazila učinkovitost intervencije. Da bi procenili našu predloženu metodu, predstavljamo novi set podataka koji je kolekcija kliničkih ispitivanja zajedno sa njihovim povezanim člancima PubMed a. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost proizvodnje kratkih informativnih sažetaka i koristiti ih kako bi predvidjeli učinkovitost intervencije.', 'fi': 'Kliiniset tutkimukset tarjoavat perustavanlaatuisen mahdollisuuden löytää uusia hoitoja ja edistää lääketieteellistä tietämystä. Oikeudenkäynnin tulokseen liittyvä epävarmuus voi kuitenkin johtaa odottamattomiin kustannuksiin ja takaiskuihin. Tässä tutkimuksessa ehdotamme uutta menetelmää intervention tehokkuuden ennustamiseen kliinisessä tutkimuksessa. Menetelmämme perustuu informatiivisen yhteenvedon tuottamiseen useista kirjallisuudesta saatavissa olevista tutkimuksista. Menetelmämme kokoaa ensin kaikki interventioon liittyvien PubMed-artikkeleiden tiivistelmät. Tämän jälkeen jokaisesta abstraktista poimitaan automaattisesti todistuslause, joka välittää tietoa intervention tehokkuudesta. Tiivistelmistä otettujen todistuslauseiden pohjalta tehdään lyhyt yhteenveto interventiosta. Lisäksi tuotettuja yhteenvetoja käytetään BERT-pohjaisen luokittelijan kouluttamiseen, jotta voidaan päätellä toimenpiteen tehokkuus. Ehdotetun menetelmän arvioimiseksi esittelemme uuden aineiston, joka on kokoelma kliinisiä tutkimuksia ja niihin liittyviä PubMed-artikkeleita. Kokeemme osoittavat lyhyiden informatiivistelmien tuottamisen tehokkuuden ja niiden käytön intervention tehokkuuden ennustamiseen.', 'et': 'Kliinilised uuringud pakuvad olulist võimalust avastada uusi raviviise ja edendada meditsiinilisi teadmisi. Kohtuprotsessi tulemuste ebakindlus võib siiski põhjustada ettenägematuid kulusid ja tagasilööke. Selles uuringus pakume välja uut meetodit sekkumise efektiivsuse prognoosimiseks kliinilises uuringus. Meie meetod põhineb informatiivse kokkuvõtte koostamisel mitmetest kirjanduses kättesaadavatest dokumentidest uuritava sekkumise kohta. Täpsemalt kogub meie meetod kõigepealt kõik PubMed artiklite kokkuvõtted, mis on seotud sekkumisega. Seejärel võetakse igast abstraktist automaatselt välja tõendilause, mis annab teavet sekkumise tõhususe kohta. Kokkuvõtetest välja võetud tõendilausete kogumi põhjal koostatakse lühikokkuvõte sekkumisest. Koostatud kokkuvõtteid kasutatakse BERTil põhineva klassifitseerija koolitamiseks, et teha järeldusi sekkumise tõhususe kohta. Meie kavandatud meetodi hindamiseks tutvustame uut andmekogumit, mis on kliiniliste uuringute kogum koos nendega seotud PubMed artiklitega. Meie katsed näitavad lühikeste informatiivsete kokkuvõtete koostamise efektiivsust ja nende kasutamist sekkumise efektiivsuse prognoosimiseks.', 'jv': 'Culah iku Nanging, kok ora ngerasai perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan nganggo percoyo sampek ora ono ora ngerasai. Nang ujaran-ingkang iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem anyir kanggo ngerasakno kanggo nyeasakno kanggo nyeasakno ning acara dhéwé. method Juara-Juara, perangkat dhéwé ngregani soko hal-hal nganggo pergambar Pubmed kuwi nggawe barang sing dibutuhke tarjamahan politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ngawe Tulung, nggunakake dipunangé dipunangé kanggo luwih-luwih basa BERT, kaya ngono nggawe barang kanggo ngilanggar To assess the proposal method, we input new data set Awakdhéwé éntuk', 'ha': "Saurin-jarrabai na ƙari, za'a sami fursa na muhimmi da za'a gane wata cutanewa na sãbuwa kuma a gabatar da ilmi na kafirta. However, the uncertainty of the outcome of a trial can lead to unforeseen costs and setbacks.  A cikin wannan littafin, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi na gabani da wajen aikin idan an yi fasa a cikin jarraba ɗimi. Taimakonmu na dõgara a ƙara wani takardar lãbãri daga wasu takardar aiki da ke iya haɗa cikin littafin da ke samun an haramtar da shi a ƙarami. A kan ƙayyade, metoden mu ke kusantar da duk abubucts of Pubmed masu husũma da intake. Sa'an nan, wata kalma mai bayani, da ta gaya lãbãri game da masu amfani da intake, za'a tafiyar da shi farat ɗaya daga duk raƙunci. Basan da aka daidaita matsayin bayani da aka samu daga mazaɓa, an baka wani kure da ke cikin tsakanin. Ga ƙarshe, an a yi amfani da yakarin da aka samu zuwa a ƙidãya mai basara BERT, dõmin ya ƙara amfani da intake. To, dõmin ka ƙayyade hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata, za mu introduce wani tsari na zaluman da ke haɗa kayan cikin jarrabai masu kifi da sunan da masu husũma da Pubmed. Kayan jarrabyinMu, ka nuna aikin ta samu'a ga masu fassarar lãbãri masu ƙaranci kuma ka yi amfani da su dõmin ka yi bayani ga fassarar intake.", 'sk': 'Klinična preskušanja ponujajo temeljno priložnost za odkrivanje novih zdravljenj in napredovanje medicinskega znanja. Vendar pa lahko negotovost izida sojenja povzroči nepredvidene stroške in neuspehe. V tej študiji predlagamo novo metodo za napovedovanje učinkovitosti intervencije v kliničnem preskušanju. Naša metoda temelji na ustvarjanju informativnega povzetka iz več dokumentov, ki so na voljo v literaturi o obravnavani intervenciji. Natančneje, naša metoda najprej zbere vse povzetke člankov PubMed, povezanih z intervencijo. Nato se iz vsakega povzetka avtomatično izvleče dokazni stavek, ki posreduje informacije o učinkovitosti intervencije. Na podlagi nabora dokaznih stavkov iz povzetkov je sestavljen kratek povzetek intervencije. Nazadnje se pripravljeni povzetki uporabljajo za usposabljanje klasifikatorja, ki temelji na BERT, da se ugotovi učinkovitost intervencije. Za oceno naše predlagane metode predstavljamo nov nabor podatkov, ki je zbirka kliničnih preskušanj skupaj z njimi povezanimi članki PubMed. Naši poskusi dokazujejo učinkovitost priprave kratkih informativnih povzetkov in njihove uporabe za napovedovanje učinkovitosti intervencije.', 'he': 'ניסויים קליניים מציעים הזדמנות בסיסית לגלות טיפולים חדשים ולהתקדם את הידע הרפואי. עם זאת, חוסר בטוחות בתוצאות המשפט יכולה להוביל לעלות ולא צפויות. במחקר הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה לחזות את היעילות של התערבות במבחן קליני. Our method relies on generating an informative summary from multiple documents available in the literature about the intervention under study.  במיוחד, השיטה שלנו קודם אוספת את כל המסגרים של מאמרים PubMed קשורים לתערבות. ואז, משפט ראיות, שמעביר מידע על היעילות של התערבות, מווצא באופן אוטומטי מכל אסטרקט. בהתבסס על קבוצת משפטי ראיות שנוצאים מהאסטרקטים, נבנה סכם קצר על ההתערבות. סוף סוף, הסדרות המוצרות משתמשות לאימון מסווג מבוסס על BERT, כדי למצוא את היעילות של התערבות. כדי להעריך את השיטה המוצעת שלנו, אנחנו מציגים קבוצת נתונים חדשה שהיא אוסף של ניסויים קליניים יחד עם המאמרים שלהם PubMed. הניסויים שלנו, מראים את היעילות של יצירת ציונים מידעיים קצרים ושימוש בהם כדי לחזות את היעילות של התערבות.', 'bo': 'དཔྱད་གཞིའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ནི་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་བྱ་རིམ་གསར་བ་དང་འཕེལ་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ག ཡིན་ནའང་། ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མེད་པར་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མི་སྲིད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཉུང་མེད་སྐྱེས་པས། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་གནད་སྡུད་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིག་གི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོར་བ་དང་སྔོན་སྟོན་ཐབས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་རྟོགས ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་ནས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་པོ་ནས་PubMed ཡི་མ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ཀྱིས་བསྡད་ཐུབ། དེ་ནས་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ངེས་པར་དྲན་སྐོར་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཚེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གསལ་ཁྲད་ནས་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏེ། མཐའ་མར་མ་དེ། བཟོ་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་དེ་BERT་ལ་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་སྒོ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་ངེད་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་གནད་སྡུད་གླེང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛུ ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ན། བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་རིམ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ནུས་སྐྱེན་ཚད་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'BiTIIMT: طريقة ملء نص ثنائي اللغة للترجمة الآلية التفاعلية', 'es': 'BitiIMT: un método bilingüe de relleno de texto para la traducción automática interactiva', 'fr': 'BitIMT\xa0: une méthode de remplissage de texte bilingue pour la traduction automatique interactive', 'pt': 'BiTIIMT: um método de preenchimento de texto bilíngue para tradução automática interativa', 'ja': 'BiTIIMT ：対話型機械翻訳のためのバイリンガルテキスト入力方法', 'zh': 'BiTIIMT曰:一交互式机器翻译双语文本充法', 'hi': 'BiTIIMT: इंटरैक्टिव मशीन अनुवाद के लिए एक द्विभाषी पाठ-infilling विधि', 'ru': 'BiTIIMT: двуязычный метод ввода текста для интерактивного машинного перевода', 'ga': 'BiTIIMT: Modh Dátheangach-Líonaithe Téacs le haghaidh Aistriú Meaisín Idirghníomhach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια δίγλωσση μέθοδος συμπλήρωσης κειμένου για διαδραστική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'BiTIIMT: un metodo bilingue per la traduzione automatica interattiva', 'hu': 'BiTIIMT: Kétnyelvű szövegtöltési módszer az interaktív gépi fordításhoz', 'lt': 'BiTIIMT: dvikalbis teksto įterpimo metodas interaktyviam mašinų vertimui', 'kk': 'BiTIIMT: Интерактивті машинаны аудару үшін екі бөлек мәтін ендіру әдісі', 'mk': 'БИТИМТ: Дивјазичен метод за преведување на текст за интерактивен машински превод', 'ms': 'BiTIIMT: Kaedah Penyerahan Teks Bilingual untuk Terjemahan Mesin Interaktif', 'mn': 'BiTIIMT: Интерактив машины хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд хоёр давхар текст-доорх арга', 'no': 'BiTIIMT: Ein bilinguelt tekstinfileringsmetode for interaktiv maskinsomsetjing', 'mt': 'BiTIIMT: Metodu Bilingwu ta’ Infiljazzjoni tat-Test għat-Traduzzjoni Interattiva tal-Magni', 'ml': 'BiTIIMT: A Bilingual Text-infilling Method for Interactive Machine Translation', 'si': 'BiTIIMT: බිලින්ගුල් පාළුවක් ඇතුළත් පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය', 'ro': 'BiTIIMT: O metodă bilingvă de umplere a textelor pentru traducerea automată interactivă', 'pl': 'BiTIIMT: Dwujęzyczna metoda wypełniania tekstu dla interaktywnego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'sr': 'BiTIIMT: Međusobni metod ulaska u tekst za interaktivni prevod mašine', 'so': 'BiTIIMT: A Bilingual Text-infilling Method for Interactive Machine Translation', 'ur': 'BiTIIMT: انٹراکسٹی ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے ایک دوبلینگ ٹیکسٹ-انفولینگ طریقہ', 'sv': 'BiTIIMT: En tvåspråkig textfyllningsmetod för interaktiv maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'BiTIIMT: A Bilingual Text-infilling Method for Interactive Machine Translation', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'BiTIMINTT: Một phương pháp chữa cháy nhãn cho dịch cơ bản tương tác', 'da': 'BiTIIMT: En tosproget tekstfyldningsmetode til interaktiv maskinoversættelse', 'bg': 'БиТИМТ: Двуезичен метод за попълване на текст за интерактивен машинен превод', 'hr': 'BiTIIMT: Međusobni metod uvlačenja teksta za interaktivni prevod stroja', 'nl': 'BiTIIMT: Een tweetalige tekstvulmethode voor interactieve machinevertaling', 'id': 'BiTIIMT: Sebuah Metode Penyerahan Teks Bilingual untuk Translation Mesin Interaktif', 'de': 'BiTIIMT: Eine zweisprachige Textfüllmethode für die interaktive maschinelle Übersetzung', 'fa': 'BiTIIMT: یک روش درآمد متن دوگانه برای ترجمه ماشین متفاوتی', 'ko': 'BITIMT: 대화형 기계 번역을 위한 이중 언어 텍스트 채우기 방법', 'sw': 'BiTIIMT: Utafiti wa Kiandishi cha Kiingereza wa Kibilingumu wa Utafiti wa Mashine ya Kimataifa', 'tr': 'BiTIIMT', 'af': "BiTIIMT: ' n tweede teks- infilerende metode vir Interaktiewe Masjien Vertaling", 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'ԲիՏԻՄՏ. Ինտերակտիվ մեքենայի թարգմանման երկլեզու մեթոդը', 'sq': 'BiTIIMT: Një metodë dygjuhëse për përkthimin Interaktiv të Makinës', 'az': 'BiTIIMT: Interaktiv Makin Çevirməsi üçün İkinci Metin-İnfigurasiya Metni', 'ca': 'BiTIIMT: Un mètode bilingüe de traducció interactiva de màquines', 'cs': 'BiTIIMT: dvojjazyčná metoda vyplňování textů pro interaktivní strojový překlad', 'bn': 'বিটিআইএমটি: ইন্টার্ভিক্ট মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য বিলিঙ্গুয়েল টেক্সট- ইনফিলিং পদ্ধতি', 'et': 'BiTIIMT: kahekeelse teksti täitmise meetod interaktiivse masintõlke jaoks', 'bs': 'BiTIIMT: Međusobni metod uvlačenja teksta za interaktivni prevod mašine', 'fi': 'BiTIIMT: Kaksikielinen tekstin täyttömenetelmä interaktiiviseen konekäännökseen', 'jv': 'BiTIEMT: Ngucap Bilingual Text-invading Method kanggo interactive Masine translation', 'he': 'ביטיימט: שיטה משולשת של טקסט לתרגום מכונות אינטראקטיבית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'BiTIIMT: Dvojezična metoda polnjenja besedila za interaktivno strojno prevajanje', 'bo': 'BiTIIMT: Bilingual Text-infilling Method for Interactive Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'The largest store of continually updating knowledge on our planet can be accessed via internet search. In this work we study giving access to this information to conversational agents. Large language models, even though they store an impressive amount of knowledge within their weights, are known to hallucinate facts when generating dialogue (Shuster et al., 2021); moreover, those facts are frozen in time at the point of model training. In contrast, we propose an approach that learns to generate an internet search query based on the context, and then conditions on the search results to finally generate a response, a method that can employ up-to-the-minute relevant information. We train and evaluate such models on a newly collected dataset of human-human conversations whereby one of the speakers is given access to internet search during knowledgedriven discussions in order to ground their responses. We find that search-query based access of the internet in conversation provides superior performance compared to existing approaches that either use no augmentation or FAISS-based retrieval (Lewis et al., 2020b).', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية التفاعلية (INMT) قادرة على ضمان ترجمات عالية الجودة من خلال أخذ التفاعلات البشرية في الاعتبار. تمكّن أنظمة الاتصالات المتنقلة الدولية الحالية التي تعتمد على فك التشفير المعجمي المقيد (LCD) البشر من الترجمة بترتيب ترجمة مرن يتجاوز من اليسار إلى اليمين. ومع ذلك ، فهم يعانون عادةً من عائقين مهمين في كفاءة الترجمة وجودتها بسبب الاعتماد على شاشات الكريستال السائل. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نظام BiTIIMT الجديد ، ملء النص ثنائي اللغة للترجمة الآلية العصبية التفاعلية. الفكرة الرئيسية لـ BiTIIMT هي ملء النص ثنائي اللغة (BiTI) والذي يهدف إلى ملء الأجزاء المفقودة في ترجمة تمت مراجعتها يدويًا لجملة مصدر معينة. نقترح حلاً بسيطًا ولكنه فعال من خلال تحويل هذه المهمة إلى مهمة تسلسل إلى تسلسل. وبهذه الطريقة ، يقوم نظامنا بفك التشفير دون قيود صريحة ويستفيد بشكل كامل من الكلمات المنقحة لتحسين التنبؤ بالترجمة. تظهر نتائج التجربة أن BiTiIMT يؤدي أداءً أفضل وأسرع بشكل ملحوظ من IMT المعتمد على شاشات الكريستال السائل الحديثة في ثلاث مهام ترجمة.', 'es': 'La traducción automática neuronal interactiva (INMT) puede garantizar traducciones de alta calidad al tener en cuenta las interacciones humanas. Los sistemas IMT existentes que se basan en la decodificación léxica restringida (LCD) permiten a los humanos traducir en un orden de traducción flexible más allá de la de izquierda a derecha. Sin embargo, suelen sufrir dos limitaciones importantes en la eficiencia y la calidad de la traducción debido a la dependencia de la pantalla LCD. En este trabajo, proponemos un novedoso sistema BiTiIMT, llenado de texto bilingüe para la traducción automática neuronal interactiva. La idea clave de BiTiIMT es el llenado de texto bilingüe (BiTI), que tiene como objetivo llenar los segmentos que faltan en una traducción revisada manualmente para una oración fuente determinada. Proponemos una solución simple pero eficaz al convertir esta tarea como una tarea de secuencia a secuencia. De esta manera, nuestro sistema realiza la decodificación sin restricciones explícitas y utiliza al máximo las palabras revisadas para una mejor predicción de la traducción. Los resultados de los experimentos muestran que BitIIMT funciona significativamente mejor y más rápido que la IMT basada en LCD de última generación en tres tareas de traducción.', 'pt': 'A tradução automática neural interativa (INMT) é capaz de garantir traduções de alta qualidade levando em consideração as interações humanas. Os sistemas IMT existentes que contam com decodificação restrita léxica (LCD) permitem que os humanos traduzam em uma ordem de tradução flexível além da esquerda para a direita. No entanto, eles normalmente sofrem de duas limitações significativas na eficiência e qualidade da tradução devido à dependência do LCD. Neste trabalho, propomos um novo sistema BiTIIMT, Bilingual Text-Infilling for Interactive Neural Machine Translation. A ideia-chave do BiTIIMT é o Bilingual Text-infilling (BiTI), que visa preencher segmentos ausentes em uma tradução revisada manualmente para uma determinada frase de origem. Propomos uma solução simples, mas eficaz, lançando essa tarefa como uma tarefa de sequência a sequência. Desta forma, nosso sistema realiza a decodificação sem restrições explícitas e faz pleno uso de palavras revisadas para melhor previsão de tradução. Os resultados do experimento mostram que o BiTiIMT tem um desempenho significativamente melhor e mais rápido do que o IMT baseado em LCD de última geração em três tarefas de tradução.', 'fr': "La traduction automatique neuronale interactive (INMT) est en mesure de garantir des traductions de haute qualité en tenant compte des interactions humaines. Les systèmes IMT existants qui reposent sur le décodage lexical contraint (LCD) permettent aux humains de traduire dans un ordre de traduction flexible au-delà de la gauche vers la droite. Cependant, ils souffrent généralement de deux limitations importantes en termes d'efficacité et de qualité de la traduction en raison de la dépendance à l'égard de l'écran LCD. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un nouveau système BitIMT, Bilingual Text-Inilling for Interactive Neural Machine Translation. L'idée clé de BitIIMT est le remplissage de texte bilingue (BiTI) qui vise à remplir les segments manquants dans une traduction révisée manuellement pour une phrase source donnée. Nous proposons une solution simple mais efficace en transformant cette tâche en tâche séquence par séquence. De cette façon, notre système effectue le décodage sans contraintes explicites et utilise pleinement les mots révisés pour une meilleure prédiction de traduction. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent que BitIIMT est nettement plus performant et plus rapide que l'IMT sur écran LCD de pointe sur trois tâches de traduction.", 'ja': '対話型ニューラル機械翻訳（ INMT ）は、人間の相互作用を考慮することによって高品質の翻訳を保証することができます。 語彙的制約付きデコード（ LCD ）に依存する既存のIMTシステムは、人間が左から右へと柔軟な翻訳順序で翻訳することを可能にします。 しかし、通常、LCDに依存しているため、翻訳効率と品質に2つの大きな制限があります。 この研究では、新しいBiTIIMTシステム、対話型ニューラル機械翻訳のためのバイリンガルテキストインフィルメントを提案します。 BiTIIMTの鍵となるアイデアは、バイリンガルテキストインフィリング（ BiTI ）であり、特定のソース文の手動で改訂された翻訳の欠落したセグメントを埋めることを目的としています。 このタスクをシーケンスツーシーケンスタスクとしてキャスティングすることにより、シンプルでありながら効果的な解決策を提案します。 このようにして、当社のシステムは明示的な制約なしにデコードを実行し、改訂された単語をフルに使用して、より良い翻訳予測を実現します。 実験結果によると、BiTiIMTは、3つの翻訳タスクで最先端のLCDベースのIMTよりも著しく優れ、速いパフォーマンスを発揮することが示されています。', 'zh': '交互式神经机器翻译 (INMT) 能虑人工之交以保高质量译。 今 IMT 系于词法约解码 (LCD),使人得以从左到右灵译次第译之。 然以 LCD 所恃,常为译效率、质二大限。 新颖BiTIIMT系统,交互式神经机器翻译双语文本填。 BiTIIMT之要,双语文本充(BiTI),指补给定源句者手动修译阙失之片段。 转为序列,以立简解决方案。 以此行之,无显式约束之解码,而充修单词以重译占。 实验结果表明三转,BiTiIMT性明优于先进之LCDIMT。', 'hi': 'इंटरैक्टिव न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (INMT) मानव इंटरैक्शन को ध्यान में रखकर उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले अनुवादों की गारंटी देने में सक्षम है। लेक्सिकल विवश डिकोडिंग (एलसीडी) पर निर्भर मौजूदा आईएमटी सिस्टम मनुष्यों को बाएं से दाएं से परे एक लचीले अनुवाद क्रम में अनुवाद करने में सक्षम बनाता है। हालांकि, वे आमतौर पर एलसीडी पर निर्भरता के कारण अनुवाद दक्षता और गुणवत्ता में दो महत्वपूर्ण सीमाओं से पीड़ित होते हैं। इस काम में, हम एक उपन्यास BiTIIMT प्रणाली, इंटरैक्टिव तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए द्विभाषी पाठ-Infilling का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। BiTIIMT के लिए महत्वपूर्ण विचार द्विभाषी पाठ-इनफिलिंग (BiTI) है जिसका उद्देश्य किसी दिए गए स्रोत वाक्य के लिए मैन्युअल रूप से संशोधित अनुवाद में लापता खंडों को भरना है। हम इस कार्य को अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम कार्य के रूप में कास्टिंग करके एक सरल अभी तक प्रभावी समाधान का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस तरह, हमारी प्रणाली स्पष्ट बाधाओं के बिना डिकोडिंग करती है और बेहतर अनुवाद भविष्यवाणी के लिए संशोधित शब्दों का पूरा उपयोग करती है। प्रयोग के परिणामों से पता चलता है कि BiTiIMT तीन अनुवाद कार्यों पर अत्याधुनिक एलसीडी-आधारित आईएमटी की तुलना में काफी बेहतर और तेज़ प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Интерактивный нейронный машинный перевод (INMT) способен гарантировать высококачественные переводы, принимая во внимание человеческие взаимодействия. Существующие системы IMT, основанные на лексическом ограниченном декодировании (LCD), позволяют людям переводить в гибком порядке перевода за пределы слева направо. Тем не менее, они, как правило, страдают от двух существенных ограничений в эффективности и качестве перевода из-за зависимости от ЖК-дисплея. В этой работе мы предлагаем новую систему BiTIIMT, двуязычную текстозаполнение для интерактивного нейронного машинного перевода. Ключевой идеей для BiTIIMT является двуязычное текстозаполнение (BiTI), которое направлено на заполнение недостающих сегментов в ручном пересмотренном переводе для данного исходного предложения. Мы предлагаем простое, но эффективное решение, ставя эту задачу как задачу последовательности. Таким образом, наша система выполняет декодирование без явных ограничений и в полной мере использует пересмотренные слова для лучшего прогнозирования перевода. Результаты эксперимента показывают, что BiTiIMT работает значительно лучше и быстрее, чем современный ЖК-дисплей на основе IMT на трех задачах перевода.', 'ga': 'Tá aistriúchán meaisín néareolaíoch idirghníomhach (INMT) in ann aistriúcháin ardcháilíochta a ráthú trí idirghníomhaíochtaí daonna a chur san áireamh. Cuireann córais reatha IMT atá ag brath ar dhíchódú srianta foclóireachta (LCD) ar chumas daoine aistriúchán in ord solúbtha aistriúcháin thar an taobh clé. Mar sin féin, go hiondúil bíonn dhá theorainn shuntasacha acu ar éifeachtúlacht agus ar cháilíocht an aistriúcháin mar gheall ar a bheith ag brath ar LCD. San obair seo, molaimid córas úr BiTIIMT, Inlíonadh Téacs Dhátheangach d’Aistriúchán Meaisín Idirghníomhach Néarthach. Is é príomh-smaoineamh BiTIIMT ná Inlíonadh Téacs Dátheangach (BiTI) a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige míreanna atá in easnamh a líonadh in aistriúchán a athbhreithnítear de láimh le haghaidh abairt foinse ar leith. Molaimid réiteach simplí ach éifeachtach tríd an tasc seo a chaitheamh mar thasc ó sheicheamh go seicheamh. Ar an mbealach seo, déanann ár gcóras díchódú gan srianta follasacha agus baintear úsáid iomlán as focail athbhreithnithe chun aistriúchán níos fearr a thuar. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh go bhfeidhmíonn BiTiIMT i bhfad níos fearr agus níos tapúla ná IMT LCD-bhunaithe den scoth ar thrí thasc aistriúcháin.', 'ka': 'ინტერქექტიური ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგუმარება IMT სისტემები, რომლებიც ლექსიკალურად დარწმუნებულიან რექსიკალური რექსიკალური რექსიკალური რექსიკალური რექსიკალური რექსიკალური რექსიკალური რექსიკალური რექსიკა მაგრამ, ისინი განსაკუთრებულია ორი მნიშვნელოვანი განსაკუთრებულებების განსაკუთრების ეფექტიურობაში და კალიტურობაზე, რადგან LCD-ზე დარჩენა. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ პრომენტის BiTIIMT სისტემის, ორივე ტექსტის შემდეგ ინტერქექტური ნეირალური მაქსინის შემწყვებისთვის გადავიწყებთ. BiTIIMT- ს გასაღები იდეა - ორივე ტექსტის შეგრძელება (BiTI) რომელიც მიზეზიან, რომ პირდაპირად რედაქტირებული შეგრძელებაში გამოყენებული სექმენტების შემდეგ გადატანა. ჩვენ უფრო მარტივი, მაგრამ ეფექტიური პასუხის გამოყენება ამ რაოდენობას, როგორც შემდეგ-დან შემდეგ რაოდენობა. ასე, ჩვენი სისტემა გამოყენება განსხვავებულ განსხვავებების გარედაქტირებული სიტყვების უფრო გამოყენება. გამოცდილების შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ BiTiIMT მნიშვნელოვანად უკეთესი და სწრაფად გამოყენებს, ვიდრე LCD-ის IMT-ის განსაზღვრებული სამუშაო სამუშაო დაწყება.', 'hu': 'Az interaktív neurális gépi fordítás (INMT) az emberi interakciók figyelembevételével képes garantálni a kiváló minőségű fordításokat. A lexikális korlátozott dekódolásra (LCD) támaszkodó meglévő IMT rendszerek lehetővé teszik, hogy az emberek rugalmas fordítási sorrendben fordítsanak le balról jobbra. Általában azonban a fordítási hatékonyság és minőség két jelentős korlátozásától szenvednek, mivel az LCD képernyőre támaszkodnak. Ebben a munkában egy új BiTIIMT rendszert javasolunk, a kétnyelvű szövegbevitel interaktív neurális fordításhoz. A BiTIIMT kulcsfontosságú ötlete a kétnyelvű szövegtöltés (BiTI), amelynek célja, hogy kitöltse a hiányzó szegmenseket egy adott forrás mondat manuálisan átdolgozott fordításában. Egy egyszerű, mégis hatékony megoldást javasolunk azáltal, hogy ezt a feladatot szekvenciáról szekvenciára vetjük. Ily módon rendszerünk kifejezett korlátozások nélkül végez dekódolást, és teljes mértékben felhasználja a módosított szavakat a jobb fordítási előrejelzés érdekében. A kísérletek eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a BiTiIMT három fordítási feladat során jelentősen jobb és gyorsabb, mint a korszerű LCD alapú IMT.', 'it': "La traduzione automatica neurale interattiva (INMT) è in grado di garantire traduzioni di alta qualità tenendo conto delle interazioni umane. I sistemi IMT esistenti che si basano sulla decodifica lessicale vincolata (LCD) consentono agli esseri umani di tradurre in un ordine di traduzione flessibile oltre quello da sinistra a destra. Tuttavia, tipicamente soffrono di due limitazioni significative in termini di efficienza e qualità della traduzione a causa della dipendenza dal display LCD. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo sistema BiTIIMT, Bilingual Text-Infilling per Interactive Neural Machine Translation. L'idea chiave di BiTIIMT è Bilingual Text-filling (BiTI) che mira a riempire i segmenti mancanti in una traduzione rivista manualmente per una data frase sorgente. Proponiamo una soluzione semplice ma efficace lanciando questo compito come un compito sequenza-sequenza. In questo modo, il nostro sistema esegue la decodifica senza vincoli espliciti e fa pieno uso di parole riviste per una migliore previsione della traduzione. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano che BiTiIMT esegue significativamente meglio e più velocemente dell'IMT LCD all'avanguardia in tre attività di traduzione.", 'el': 'Η διαδραστική νευρολογική μηχανική μετάφραση είναι σε θέση να εγγυηθεί μεταφράσεις υψηλής ποιότητας λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τις ανθρώπινες αλληλεπιδράσεις. Τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα IMT που βασίζονται στην λεξική αποκωδικοποίηση (επιτρέπουν στους ανθρώπους να μεταφράσουν με μια ευέλικτη σειρά μετάφρασης πέρα από την αριστερή προς τα δεξιά. Ωστόσο, συνήθως υποφέρουν από δύο σημαντικούς περιορισμούς στην αποδοτικότητα και ποιότητα της μετάφρασης λόγω της εξάρτησης από LCD. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο σύστημα Δίγλωσσης Πληροφόρησης Κειμένου για Διαδραστική Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση. Η βασική ιδέα για το BiTIIMT είναι η δίγλωσση συμπλήρωση κειμένου (BiTI), η οποία στοχεύει στην κάλυψη ελλειπόντων τμημάτων σε μια χειροκίνητα αναθεωρημένη μετάφραση για μια δεδομένη πρόταση προέλευσης. Προτείνουμε μια απλή αλλά αποτελεσματική λύση θέτοντας αυτή την εργασία ως εργασία ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, το σύστημά μας εκτελεί αποκωδικοποίηση χωρίς ρητούς περιορισμούς και χρησιμοποιεί πλήρως αναθεωρημένες λέξεις για καλύτερη πρόβλεψη μετάφρασης. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι το BiTiIMT αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα και ταχύτερα από το σύγχρονο IMT βασισμένο σε τρεις μεταφραστικές εργασίες.', 'lt': 'Interaktinis nervinių mašinų vertimas (INMT) gali užtikrinti aukštos kokybės vertimus, atsižvelgdamas į žmonių sąveiką. Esamos IMT sistemos, grindžiamos leksiniu apribotu dekodifikavimu (LCD), leidžia žmonėms lanksčiai vertti vertimo tvarka už kairės dešin ės ribų. Tačiau jie paprastai patiria du reikšmingus vertimo efektyvumo ir kokybės apribojimus dėl priklausomybės nuo LCD. Šiame darbe siūlome naują BiTIIMT sistemą, dvikalbį tekstą papildantį sąveikų nervinių mašinų vertimą. Pagrindinė BiTIIMT idėja yra dvikalbis teksto infiliavimas (BiTI), kuriuo siekiama užpildyti trūkstamus segmentus rankiniu persvarstytu vertimu tam tikram pradiniam sakiniui. Siūlome paprastą, tačiau veiksmingą sprendimą, kad ši užduotis būtų pavesta viena iš eilės. Tokiu būdu mūsų sistema vykdo dekodinimą be aiškių apribojimų ir visapusiškai naudoja persvarstytus žodžius geresniam vertimui prognozuoti. Experiment results show that BiTiIMT performs significantly better and faster than state-of-the-art LCD-based IMT on three translation tasks.', 'kk': 'Интерактивті невралдық компьютердің аударуы Лексикалық шектелген декодтау (LCD) жүйелеріне қатысты IMT жүйелері адамдарды сол жақтан оң жақтан артындағы гибкіл аудару ретінде аударуға мүмкіндік береді. Бірақ олар кәдімгі LCD-ге сенімділік себебі аудармалардың ең маңызды шектеулерінен және сапатты шектеулерінен қарайды. Бұл жұмыс ішінде биTIIMT жүйесі, интерактивті невралдық машинаны аудару үшін екі бөлек мәтін инфилингі қолданады. BiTIIMT үшін кілттің идеясы - екі мәтін ендіру (BiTI) деген. Бұл келтірілген көздегі сөздің қолмен өзгертілген аудармасында жоқ сегменттерді толтыруға мақсатты. Біз тапсырманы реттік тапсырма ретінде қарапайым, әлі эффективті шешім деп ұсынамыз. Бұл түрде, жүйеміздің түсінікті шектері жоқ декодтамыз және жақсы аудармаларды бақылау үшін түсінікті сөздерді толық қолдануға болады. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері BiTiIMT үш аудармалы тапсырмалардың күйіне тұратын LCD- нәтижесінен артық және жылдам жұмыс істейді.', 'mk': 'Интерактивен превод на неврални машини (INMT) може да гарантира висококвалитетни преводи со земање во предвид човечките интеракции. Постојаните ИМТ системи кои се потпираат на лексикално ограничено декодирање (LCD) им овозможуваат на луѓето да преведуваат во флексибилен ред на превод надвор од лево до десно. Сепак, тие обично страдаат од две значајни ограничувања во ефикасноста и квалитетот на преводот поради зависноста од LCD. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нов БиТИМТ систем, двогласен текст за интерактивен превод на неврални машини. Клучната идеја за BiTIIMT е двојно текстово вметнување (BiTI) кое има за цел да ги пополни недостасувачките сегменти во рачно ревидиран превод за дадена реченица од извор. Ние предложуваме едноставно но ефикасно решение со фрлање на оваа задача како задача од секвенца до секвенца. На овој начин, нашиот систем извршува декодирање без експлицитни ограничувања и целосно ги користи ревидираните зборови за подобро преведување. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека БиTiIMT функционира значително подобро и побрзо од најсовремената ИМТ базирана на LCD на три преводни задачи.', 'ms': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf interaktif (INMT) mampu menjamin terjemahan kualiti tinggi dengan mempertimbangkan interaksi manusia. Sistem IMT yang wujud bergantung pada penyahkodan terhalang leksikal (LCD) membolehkan manusia menerjemahkan dalam tertib terjemahan fleksibel di luar kiri-ke-kanan. Namun, mereka biasanya mengalami dua keterangan yang signifikan dalam efisiensi terjemahan dan kualiti kerana bergantung pada LCD. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan sistem BiTIIMT yang baru, Penyerahan Teks Bilingual untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural Interaktif. Idea kunci untuk BiTIIMT ialah penyelesaian Teks Bilingual (BiTI) yang bermaksud mengisi segmen hilang dalam terjemahan diubah secara manual untuk kalimat sumber yang diberi. Kami mengusulkan penyelesaian sederhana tetapi efektif dengan melemparkan tugas ini sebagai tugas urutan-ke-urutan. Dengan cara ini, sistem kita melakukan pengekodan tanpa keterangan eksplicit dan menggunakan perkataan yang diubah untuk ramalan terjemahan yang lebih baik. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa BiTiIMT melakukan lebih baik dan lebih cepat daripada IMT berasaskan LCD pada tiga tugas terjemahan.', 'mt': 'It-traduzzjoni interattiva tal-magni newrali (INMT) tista’ tiggarantixxi traduzzjonijiet ta’ kwalità għolja billi tqis l-interazzjonijiet tal-bniedem. Sistemi eżistenti tal-IMT li jiddependu fuq id-dekodifikazzjoni ristretta lexika (LCD) jippermettu lill-bnedmin li jittraduċu f’ordni flessibbli ta’ traduzzjoni lil hinn mix-xellug għal-lemin. Madankollu, huma tipikament ibatu minn żewġ limitazzjonijiet sinifikanti fl-effiċjenza u l-kwalità tat-traduzzjoni minħabba d-dipendenza fuq l-LCD. F’din il-ħidma, qed nipproponu sistema BiTIIMT ġdida, Bilingual Text-Infilling għat-Traduzzjoni Interattiva tal-Magni Newrali. L-idea ewlenija għal BiTIIMT hija l-infillazzjoni tat-Test Bilinguali (BiTI) li għandha l-għan li timla s-segmenti nieqsa fi traduzzjoni riveduta manwalment għal sentenza tas-sors partikolari. Aħna nipproponu soluzzjoni sempliċi iżda effettiva billi nagħmlu dan il-kompitu bħala kompitu sekwenzjali. B’dan il-mod, is-sistema tagħna tagħmel id-dekodifikazzjoni mingħajr restrizzjonijiet espliċiti u tagħmel użu sħiħ minn kliem rivedut għal tbassir aħjar tat-traduzzjoni. Experiment results show that BiTiIMT performs significantly better and faster than state-of-the-art LCD-based IMT on three translation tasks.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഇടപാടുകള്\u200d കണക്കിലേക്ക് എടുക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഇന്റര്\u200dച്ചെക്കല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d  ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ ഡികോഡിങ്ങില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന IMT സിസ്റ്റം ഇടത്തോട്ട്- വലത്തോട്ടുള്ള ഒരു ഫ്ലോക്സിബിള്\u200d പര എന്നിട്ടും എല്\u200dസിഡിയിലെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d അവര്\u200d സാധാരണ രണ രണ്ട് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരിധികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിഭാഷപ്രദ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ബിറ്റിഐമ്ടി സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ബിലിങ്ങുള്ള പദാവലി ഇന ബിടിഐമിറ്റിന്റെ പ്രധാന ആശയം ബിലിങ്കുള്ള പദാവലി- ഇന്\u200dഫ്ലിങ്ങ് ആണു് കൊടുത്ത സോഴ്സ് വാക്കിനുള്ള വാക്കിനുള്ള ഒരു കൈമാറ് ഈ ജോലിയെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയുള്ള ജോലിയായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമായിട്ടും പ്രവർ ഇങ്ങനെയാണ് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ ഡികോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ബിടിയിഎമ്ടി മൂന്നു പരിഭാഷയുടെ ജോലികളില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിനെ', 'mn': 'Interactive neural machine translation (INMT) is able to guarantee high quality translations by taking into account. Лексийн хязгаарлагдсан загвар (LCD) дээр байдаг IMT системүүд хүмүүст зүүн-ээс баруун талаас гадна гишүүмжтэй орчуулах загвараар орчуулах боломжтой болгодог. Гэвч тэд LCD-д итгэлтэй байдлаар орчуулах үйлдвэрлэл болон сайн чанарын хоёр чухал хязгаарлалтаас болдог. Энэ ажил дээр бид биTIIMT шинэ систем, интерактив мэдрэлийн механикийн хөрөнгө оруулахын тулд хоёр давтагдсан текст-инфлилинг санал болгож байна. BiTIIMT-ийн гол санаа бол хоёр дахин хэлбэрийн хэлбэрээр алдагдаг хэсэгт дүүргэх зорилго юм. Бид үүнийг дарааллаар дарааллаар давтан энгийн ч үр дүнтэй шийдэл гэж санал өгдөг. Иймээс бидний систем тодорхой хязгааргүйгээр шинэчлэлтийг ашиглаж, илүү сайн орчуулалтын таамаглалтын тулд шинэчлэлтийг ашигладаг. Түүний туршилтын үр дүнд BiTiIMT 3 орчуулагдах ажлын тухай LCD-д суурилсан IMT-ээс илүү хурдан, илүү хурдан ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Interaktywne neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe (INMT) jest w stanie zagwarantować wysokiej jakości tłumaczenia, uwzględniając interakcje człowieka. Istniejące systemy IMT oparte na dekodowaniu z ograniczeniami leksykalnymi (LCD) umożliwiają ludziom tłumaczenie w elastycznej kolejności tłumaczeń poza lewo-prawo. Zazwyczaj jednak cierpią one z powodu dwóch istotnych ograniczeń w zakresie wydajności i jakości tłumaczeń ze względu na zależność od LCD. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowy system BiTIIMT, dwujęzyczne napełnianie tekstu dla interaktywnego neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego. Kluczowym pomysłem BiTIIMT jest dwujęzyczne napełnianie tekstu (BiTI), którego celem jest wypełnienie brakujących segmentów w ręcznie poprawionym tłumaczeniu danego zdania źródłowego. Proponujemy proste, ale skuteczne rozwiązanie, oddając to zadanie jako zadanie sekwencyjne. W ten sposób nasz system wykonuje dekodowanie bez wyraźnych ograniczeń i w pełni wykorzystuje zmienione słowa dla lepszej predykcji tłumaczenia. Wyniki eksperymentu pokazują, że BiTiIMT działa znacznie lepiej i szybciej niż najnowocześniejsze IMT oparte na LCD w trzech zadaniach tłumaczeniowych.', 'sr': 'Interaktivni prevod neuralne mašine (INMT) može garantirati prevod kvalitete uzimajući u obzir ljudske interakcije. Postojeći sistemi IMT koji se oslanjaju na leksički ograničeni dekodiranje (LCD) omogućavaju ljudima da prevode u fleksibilnom redu prevođenja izvan lijeve na desno. Međutim, oni obično pate od dva značajna ograničenja učinkovitosti i kvalitete prevođenja zbog pouzdanosti na LCD. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi sistem BiTIIMT, Bilingualni tekst-upaljanje za interaktivnu neuronsku prevodu mašine. Ključna ideja za BiTIIMT je Bilingualna tekstualna infilacija (BiTI), koja je cilj da ispuni nestale segmente u ručno revidiranom prevodu za određenu izvornu rečenicu. Predlažemo jednostavno, ali efikasno rešenje bacajući ovaj zadatak kao zadatak sekvence do sekvence. Na taj način, naš sistem provodi dekodiranje bez objašnjih ograničenja i potpuno koristi revidirane reči za bolje predviđanje prevoda. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da BiTiIMT izvodi značajno bolje i brže od stanja umjetnosti na LCD-u baziranog IMT na tri prevođenja zadatka.', 'ro': 'Traducerea automată neurală interactivă (INMT) este capabilă să garanteze traduceri de înaltă calitate, luând în considerare interacțiunile umane. Sistemele IMT existente care se bazează pe decodarea lexicală constrânsă (LCD) permit oamenilor să traducă într-o ordine flexibilă de traducere dincolo de stânga-dreapta. Cu toate acestea, acestea suferă de obicei de două limitări semnificative în ceea ce privește eficiența și calitatea traducerii, datorită dependenței de LCD. În această lucrare, propunem un nou sistem BiTIIMT, Introducerea textului bilingv pentru traducerea automată neurală interactivă. Ideea cheie pentru BiTIIMT este completarea textului bilingv (BiTI), care își propune să umple segmentele lipsă într-o traducere revizuită manual pentru o anumită propoziție sursă. Propunem o soluție simplă, dar eficientă prin distribuirea acestei sarcini ca o sarcină secvență-la-secvență. În acest fel, sistemul nostru realizează decodarea fără constrângeri explicite și utilizează pe deplin cuvintele revizuite pentru o mai bună predicție a traducerii. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că BiTiIMT performează semnificativ mai bine și mai rapid decât IMT LCD de ultimă generație în trei sarcini de traducere.', 'no': 'Interaktiv neuralmaskinsomsetjing (INMT) kan garantira omsetjingar med høg kvalitet ved å ta menneske interaksjonar i konto. Dei eksisterande IMT-systema som vert på leksisk begrenset dekoding (LCD) slår på at menneske kan oversette i ein fleksibel oversettelsrekkefølgje enn venstre til høgre. Men dei har vanlegvis to signifikante begrensningar i omsetjingsfeilighet og kvalitet på grunn av tilbakekallinga på LCD. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit roman BiTIIMT- system, bilengre tekstinfilling for interaktiv neiralmaskinsomsetjing. Nøkkelideen til BiTIIMT er Bilinguelt tekstinfilering (BiTI), som må fyllast manglande segmentar i ei manuelt revisert omsetjing for ei gitt kjeldesetning. Vi foreslår ein enkel enn effektiv løysing ved å kasta denne oppgåva som ei sequence-to-sequence oppgåve. På denne måten utfører systemet vårt dekoding utan eksplisitt begrensningar og gjer fullstendig bruk av reviserte ord for bedre oversettelsforhåndsvising. Eksperimentresultat viser at BiTiIMT utfører betyr og raskare enn LCD-basert IMT på tre omsetjingsprogrammer.', 'so': 'Turjumista maskinada ee Interactive neural maskine (INMT) wuxuu ku garan karaa turjumaadda aad u qiimeysan karto marka lagu qaadanayo interactions dadka. Tirada IMT ee joogta oo ku tiirsan lexical constrained decoding (LCD) waxay enabled humans to translate in a flexible translation order beyond the left-to-right. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay si caadiga ah ugu xanuunsadaan laba xadir oo muhiim ah oo ay ku xiran tahay aqoonta turjumaadda iyo qiimo ahaanshaha LCD darteed. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa nidaam BiTIIMT, bilingual Text-Infilling for Interactive Neural Machine Translation. The key idea to BiTIIMT is Bilingual Text-infilling (BiTI) which aims to fill missing segments in a manually revised translation for a given source sentence.  Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa xalal fudud oo weli shaqo leh, si aan u dhigno shaqadaas shaqo dabar-dabar. Sida darteed nidaamka ayaa qorsheynta u sameeya iyadoo aan qasab cad ahayn, wuxuuna isticmaalaa hadal beddelan si loo sii sheego wax turjumista wanaagsan. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in BiTiIMT uu sameeyo si aad u wanaagsan oo u dhaqso badan oo ka degdeg badan dowladda-the-art LCD-based IMT ku sameeyo saddex shaqooyin turjuman.', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை கணக்கில் எடுத்து உயர்தரமான மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை உறுதிப்படுத்த முடியும். Name ஆனால், அவர்கள் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு சார்ந்த எல்லைகளிலிருந்து இரண்டு முக்கியமான எல்லைகளில் இருந்து பாதுகாப்பு ஏற்படுகி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய பிடிIMT முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், பில்லிங்குல் உரையை மொழிபெயர்ப்பாக்குவதற்கான BiTIIMT க்கான முக்கிய கருத்து பில்லிங்குல் உரை- உள்ளிடுதல் (பிடிடி) கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மூல வாக்கியத்திற்காக கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பிரிவி நாம் ஒரு எளிய தீர்வு இன்னும் வெளிப்படையான தீர்வு மூலம் இந்த செயலை பின்வரும் தொடர்ந்து வரும் பணியாக வைத்த இந்த வழியில், எங்கள் கணினி வெளிப்படையான கட்டுப்பாடுகள் இல்லாமல் குறியீட்டை செயல்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் மேலும் மொழிப முயற்சி முடிவுகள் மூன்று மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணிகளில் பிடிIMT மிகவும் சிறந்த மற்றும் வேகமாக செயல்படுகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තන (INMT) විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් මිනිස්සු සම්බන්ධතාවක් ගණනාකර ඉතින් ඉතින් IMT පද්ධතියක් ලෙක්සිකාලික සීමාවිත විස්තර කරන්න (LCD) කිරීම සඳහා මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරවාද කරන්න පුළුවන් විස නමුත්, ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් LCD විශ්වාසයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය දෙකක් න මේ වැඩේ අපි නියම BiTIIMT පද්ධතියක්, බිලින්ගුල් පාළුවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. @ info අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මේ වැඩියාව පරික්ෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් පරික්ෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන මෙහෙම විදියට, අපේ පද්ධතිය පැහැදිලි සීමාවක් නැති විසින් ඩිකෝඩ් කරනවා ඒ වගේම හොඳ වාර්ථාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය ක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ BiTiIMT ගොඩක් හොඳ හා වේගයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ LCD-ආධාරිත IMT විදිහට පර', 'sv': 'Interaktiv neural maskinöversättning (INMT) kan garantera översättningar av hög kvalitet genom att ta hänsyn till mänskliga interaktioner. Befintliga IMT-system som förlitar sig på lexikal begränsad avkodning (LCD) gör det möjligt för människor att översätta i en flexibel översättningsordning bortom vänster-till-höger. De lider dock vanligtvis av två betydande begränsningar i översättningseffektivitet och kvalitet på grund av att de är beroende av LCD. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett nytt BiTIIMT-system, tvåspråkig text-inflilling för interaktiv neural maskinöversättning. Nyckelidén till BiTIIMT är tvåspråkig textfyllning (BiTI) som syftar till att fylla saknade segment i en manuellt reviderad översättning för en given källmening. Vi föreslår en enkel men effektiv lösning genom att kasta denna uppgift som en sekvens-till-sekvens uppgift. På så sätt utför vårt system avkodning utan uttryckliga begränsningar och utnyttjar fullt ut reviderade ord för bättre översättningsförutsägelse. Experimentsresultat visar att BiTiIMT presterar betydligt bättre och snabbare än den senaste LCD-baserade IMT på tre översättningsuppgifter.', 'ur': 'انٹراکسٹی نیورال ماشین کی ترجمہ (INMT) اچھی کیفیت ترجمہ کا قادر ہے کہ انسان کی تعاملات کو حساب کے ذریعہ اٹھانے کے ذریعہ انسان کی تعاملات کا ارادہ کرے۔ موجود IMT سیسٹم لکسیکل محدود ڈیکوڈینگ (LCD) پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں، انسان کو بائیں بائیں بائیں سے دائیں جانب سے بہت سی ترجمہ کے اندر ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے اجازت دیتے ہیں. لیکن ان کو السی ڈی پر اعتماد کی وجہ سے دو اہم حدود پہنچاتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اس کام میں ایک نور BiTIIMT سیستم کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہے، بیلینگ ٹیکسٹ-اینفالینگ کیلئے بیٹراکسٹی نیورال ماشین کی ترجمہ کے لئے۔ BiTIIMT کے لئے کلی ایڈیون دوئلینگ ٹکسٹ-انفولینگ (BiTI) ہے جس کا ارادہ ہے کہ ایک مقررہ سورج ویڈیوں کے لئے ایک ہاتھی سے تغییر بدل دیا گیا ہے۔ ہم ایک ساده اور اثرات حل کی پیشنهاد کریں گے اس کام کو ایک سطح-تا-سطح کام کے طور پر کاسٹ کر۔ اسی طرح، ہماری سیسٹم صریح محدودیت کے بغیر دھوکیڈ کرتا ہے اور بہتر ترجمہ پیش بینی کے لئے دھوکیڈ کی کلمات کو پورا استعمال کرتا ہے. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ BiTiIMT تین ترجمہ کے کاموں پر زیادہ بہتر اور سریع عمل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info Existing IMT systems relying on lexical constrained decoding (LCD) enable humans to translate in a flexible translation order beyond the left-to-right.  Lekin ular odatda LCD ishoniga ishonch qo'llangan ikkita muhim chegaralardan foydalanadi. Bu ishda biz Interactive Neural Mashine tarjima qilish uchun novel BiTIIMT tizimni yaratib beramiz. @ info: whatsthis Biz bu vazifani keyingi cheksiz vazifa sifatida o'zgartirish orqali oddiy va effektiv yo'l qilamiz. Shunday qilib, bizning tizimimiz tahrirlash muvaffaqiyatlarini bajaradi va yaxshi tarjima qilish uchun o'zgartirilgan so'zlarni bajaradi. Name", 'vi': 'Dịch cỗ máy thần kinh tương tác (INMTV) có khả năng đảm bảo dịch chất lượng cao bằng cách tính tương tác con người. Sự tồn tại của Hệ thống IM nhờ vào mã hóa bị hạn chế từ vựng (LCD) cho phép con người dịch theo thứ tự dịch linh hoạt vượt qua bên trái-phải. Tuy nhiên, họ thường phải chịu đựng hai giới hạn đáng kể về hiệu quả dịch chuyển và chất lượng nhờ vào LCD. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống BiTIMIT mới, Dịch Dịch Dịch Dịch Ngôn ngữ Dịch Dịch Dịch Dịch Dịch Hạch. Điều quan trọng nhất của BiTIMINT là chữa cháy nhãn tin (BiTI) nhằm lấp đầy các đoạn bị mất trong một bản dịch được chỉnh lại bằng tay cho một câu đầu tiên. Chúng tôi đề nghị một giải pháp đơn giản nhưng hiệu quả bằng cách chọn nhiệm vụ này như một nhiệm vụ liên tiếp. Bằng cách này, hệ thống của chúng tôi làm việc giải mã mà không cần ràng buộc dứt khoát và sử dụng đầy đủ từ sửa đổi để dự đoán dịch thuật tốt hơn. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy BiTilMIT thực hiện tốt hơn và nhanh hơn thời đại biểu tượng LCD dựa trên ba dịch vụ.', 'nl': 'Interactive neural machine translation (INMT) kan hoogwaardige vertalingen garanderen door rekening te houden met menselijke interacties. Bestaande IMT-systemen die vertrouwen op lexical considered decodering (LCD) stellen mensen in staat om te vertalen in een flexibele vertaalvolgorde buiten de links-naar-rechts. Ze hebben echter meestal te maken met twee belangrijke beperkingen in vertaalefficiëntie en -kwaliteit als gevolg van de afhankelijkheid van LCD. In dit werk stellen we een nieuw BiTIIMT-systeem voor, Tweetalige Tekst-Invullen voor Interactieve Neural Machine Translation. Het belangrijkste idee van BiTIIMT is tweetalige tekst-infilling (BiTI) die bedoeld is om ontbrekende segmenten te vullen in een handmatig herziene vertaling voor een bepaalde bronzin. We stellen een eenvoudige maar effectieve oplossing voor door deze taak als een sequentie-to-sequentie taak te beschouwen. Op deze manier voert ons systeem decodering uit zonder expliciete beperkingen en maakt volledig gebruik van herziene woorden voor een betere vertaalvoorspelling. Uit experimenten blijkt dat BiTiIMT bij drie vertaaltaken aanzienlijk beter en sneller presteert dan state-of-the-art LCD-gebaseerde IMT.', 'da': 'Interactive neural machine translation (INMT) er i stand til at garantere oversættelser af høj kvalitet ved at tage hensyn til menneskelige interaktioner. Eksisterende IMT-systemer, der er afhængige af leksikalsk begrænset afkodning (LCD), gør det muligt for mennesker at oversætte i en fleksibel oversættelsesrækkefølge ud over venstre mod højre. De lider dog typisk af to betydelige begrænsninger i oversættelseseffektivitet og kvalitet på grund af afhængigheden af LCD. I dette arbejde foreslår vi et nyt BiTIIMT system, tosproget tekst-indførsel til interaktiv neural maskinoversættelse. Nøgleideen til BiTIIMT er tosproget tekst-fyldning (BiTI), som har til formål at udfylde manglende segmenter i en manuelt revideret oversættelse for en given kildesætning. Vi foreslår en enkel, men effektiv løsning ved at kaste denne opgave som en sekvens-til-sekvens opgave. På denne måde udfører vores system afkodning uden eksplicitte begrænsninger og gør fuld brug af reviderede ord for bedre oversættelsesforudsigelse. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at BiTiIMT udfører betydeligt bedre og hurtigere end state-of-the-art LCD-baseret IMT på tre oversættelsesopgaver.', 'bg': 'Интерактивният невронен машинен превод (ИНМТ) е в състояние да гарантира висококачествени преводи, като се вземат предвид човешките взаимодействия. Съществуващите IMT системи, разчитащи на лексикално ограничено декодиране (LCD), позволяват на хората да превеждат в гъвкав ред на преводи отвъд ляво надясно. Те обаче обикновено страдат от две значителни ограничения в ефективността и качеството на превода поради зависимостта от дисплея. В тази работа предлагаме нова система двуезично текстово пълнене за интерактивен неврален машинен превод. Ключовата идея на БиТИИМТ е двуезичното попълване на текст (БиТИ), което цели да запълни липсващите сегменти в ръчно ревизиран превод за дадено изречение източник. Предлагаме просто, но ефективно решение, като излъчваме тази задача като задача последователност по последователност. По този начин нашата система извършва декодиране без изрични ограничения и използва изцяло ревизирани думи за по-добро прогнозиране на превода. Резултатите от експеримента показват, че изпълнява значително по-добре и по-бързо от най-съвременните ИМТ на базата на LCD по три преводни задачи.', 'hr': 'Interaktivni prevod neuralnih strojeva (INMT) može garantirati prevod kvalitete uzimajući u obzir ljudske interakcije. Postojeći IMT sustavi koji se oslanjaju na leksički ograničeni dekodiranje (LCD) omogućavaju ljudima prevoditi u fleksibilnom redosljedu prevoda izvan lijeve na desno. Međutim, oni obično pate od dva značajna ograničenja učinkovitosti i kvalitete prevođenja zbog pouzdanosti na LCD-u. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi sistem BiTIIMT, Bilingualni tekst-Infilling za interaktivni neuronski prevod strojeva. Ključna ideja za BiTIIMT je dvostruka uvlačenja teksta (BiTI) koja se cilja napuniti nestale segmente u ručno preobraćenom prevodu za određenu izvornu rečenicu. Predlažemo jednostavno, ali efikasno rješenje bacajući ovaj zadatak kao zadatak sekvence do sekvence. Na taj način, naš sustav provodi dekodiranje bez objašnjih ograničenja i potpuno koristi revizirane riječi za bolje predviđanje prevoda. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da BiTiIMT izvodi značajno bolje i brže od stanja umjetne LCD-based IMT na tri prevodne zadatke.', 'ko': '인터랙티브 신경기계번역(INMT)은 인류의 상호작용을 고려함으로써 고품질의 번역을 보장할 수 있다.기존의 어법 제약 디코딩(LCD) 기반의 IMT 시스템은 인류가 왼쪽에서 오른쪽으로 유연하게 번역하는 순서에 따라 번역할 수 있게 한다.그러나 액정표시장치에 대한 의존으로 인해 그들은 통상적으로 번역 효율과 품질에 있어서 두 가지 중대한 제한을 받는다.이 작업에서 우리는 상호작용식 신경기계 번역에 사용되는 이중 언어 텍스트 충전을 위한 새로운 BITIMT 시스템을 제시했다.BITIMT의 관건적인 사상은 이중 언어 텍스트 채우기(BiTI)인데 그 목적은 주어진 원문에 대한 수동 수정 번역에서 부족한 부분을 채우는 것이다.우리는 이 임무를 하나의 서열에서 서열로 바꾸는 간단하고 효과적인 해결 방안을 제시했다.이런 방식을 통해 우리 시스템은 현식 제약 없이 디코딩을 실행하고 수정된 단어를 충분히 이용하여 더욱 좋은 번역 예측을 한다.실험 결과, 세 가지 번역 작업 중 BITIMT의 성능은 LCD 기반 IMT보다 현저히 우수하다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'de': 'Interaktive neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (INMT) ist in der Lage, qualitativ hochwertige Übersetzungen zu garantieren, indem menschliche Interaktionen berücksichtigt werden. Bestehende IMT-Systeme, die auf lexikalisch eingeschränkter Decodierung (LCD) basieren, ermöglichen es Menschen, in einer flexiblen Übersetzungsreihenfolge jenseits von links nach rechts zu übersetzen. Allerdings leiden sie typischerweise unter zwei erheblichen Einschränkungen in der Übersetzungseffizienz und -qualität aufgrund der Abhängigkeit von LCD. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein neuartiges BiTIIMT-System vor, zweisprachiges Texteinfüllen für interaktive neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung. Die Schlüsselidee von BiTIIMT ist die zweisprachige Textfüllung (BiTI), die darauf abzielt, fehlende Segmente in einer manuell überarbeiteten Übersetzung für einen bestimmten Quellsatz zu füllen. Wir schlagen eine einfache, aber effektive Lösung vor, indem wir diese Aufgabe als Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Aufgabe betrachten. Auf diese Weise führt unser System die Dekodierung ohne explizite Einschränkungen durch und nutzt überarbeitete Wörter zur besseren Vorhersage der Übersetzung. Experimente zeigen, dass BiTiIMT bei drei Übersetzungsaufgaben deutlich besser und schneller arbeitet als moderne LCD-basierte IMT.', 'id': 'Terjemahan mesin saraf interaktif (INMT) dapat menjamin terjemahan kualitas tinggi dengan mempertimbangkan interaksi manusia. Sistem IMT yang ada bergantung pada dekodasi terbatas lexik (LCD) memungkinkan manusia untuk menerjemahkan dalam urutan terjemahan fleksibel di luar kiri-ke-kanan. Namun, mereka biasanya menderita dari dua batasan signifikan dalam efisiensi terjemahan dan kualitas karena bergantung pada LCD. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan sebuah sistem BiTIIMT novel, Teks Bilingual-Infilling untuk Interactive Neural Machine Translation. The key idea to BiTIIMT is Bilingual Text-infilling (BiTI) which aims to fill missing segments in a manually revised translation for a given source sentence.  Kami mengusulkan solusi sederhana namun efektif dengan menjadikan tugas ini sebagai tugas urutan-ke-urutan. Dengan cara ini, sistem kita melakukan dekoding tanpa batasan eksplisit dan membuat penggunaan penuh dari kata-kata yang diubah untuk prediksi terjemahan yang lebih baik. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa BiTiIMT melakukan lebih baik dan lebih cepat dari IMT terbaik berdasarkan LCD pada tiga tugas terjemahan.', 'fa': 'ترجمه ماشین عصبی (INMT) با توجه به توافق انسان قادر است که ترجمه\u200cهای کیفیت بالا را تضمین کند. سیستم\u200cهای IMT وجود دارد که بر دکوندن محدودیت لغوی (LCD) اجازه می\u200cدهند انسان\u200cها را در سطح ترجمه\u200cای فراوان چپ به سمت راست ترجمه کنند. با این حال، معمولاً آنها از دو محدودیت مهم در فعالیت و کیفیت ترجمه به دلیل اعتماد به LCD رنج می\u200cبرند. در این کار، ما یک سیستم رمانی BiTIIMT را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، تغییر متن بیلینگ برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی Interactive Neural Translation. ایده کلیدی برای BiTIIMT تغییر متن دوگانه (BiTI) است که هدف می\u200cدهد بخش\u200cهای گمشده را در یک ترجمه\u200cای که به دستی تغییر داده شده برای یک جمله منبع داده شده پر کند. ما پیشنهاد می کنیم یک راه حل ساده هنوز موثر با فرستادن این کار به عنوان یک وظیفه\u200cای از طریقه\u200cها. در این صورت، سیستم ما بدون محدودیت مشخص دکوندن را انجام می دهد و کلمات تغییر داده برای پیش بینی بهتر ترجمه کامل استفاده می کند. نتایج تجربه نشان می دهد که BiTiIMT به طور کلی بهتر و سریع تر از ایالت LCD-based IMT بر سه تاریخ ترجمه انجام می دهد.', 'sq': 'Përkthimi interaktiv i makinës nervore (INMT) është në gjendje të garantojë përkthime të cilësisë së lartë duke marrë parasysh ndërveprimet njerëzore. Sistemet ekzistuese IMT mbështetur në dekodimin e kufizuar lexik (LCD) i lejojnë njerëzit të përkthyen në një rend përkthimi fleksibel përtej majtas në të djathtë. Megjithatë, ato tipikisht vuajnë nga dy kufizime të rëndësishme në efektshmërinë e përkthimit dhe cilësinë për shkak të mbështetjes në LCD. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë një sistem të ri BiTIIMT, teksti dygjuhës për përkthimin interaktiv të makinave nervore. Ideja kyçe për BiTIIMT është infillimi në tekst dygjuhës (BiTI) që synon të mbushë segmentet e munguara në një përkthim të revizuar manualisht për një fjalim të caktuar burimi. Ne propozojmë një zgjidhje të thjeshtë por efektive duke e hedhur këtë detyrë si një detyrë sekuencë-në-sekuencë. Në këtë mënyrë, sistemi ynë kryen dekodimin pa kufizime të qarta dhe përdor plotësisht fjalët e revizuara për parashikim më të mirë të përkthimit. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tregojnë se BiTiIMT funksionon ndjeshëm më mirë dhe më shpejt se IMT me bazë në LCD në tre detyra përkthimi.', 'af': "Interaktiewe neurale masjien vertaling (INMT) is in staat om hoë- kwaliteit vertalings te garanteer deur menslike interaksies in rekening te neem. Bestaande IMT stelsels wat op leksies beperkte dekodering (LCD) vertrou, aktiveer mense na vertaal in 'n fleksibel vertaling volgorde buite die links- na- regs. Maar hulle lyk tydelik van twee betekende beperking in vertaling effektief en kwaliteit vanweë die vertrouing op LCD. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n roman BiTIIMT stelsel, Bilinguele Teks- Infilling vir Interaktiewe Neurale Masjien Vertaling. Die sleutel idee na BiTIIMT is Bilinguele Teks- Invulling (BiTI) wat doel om te vul gemaakte segmente in 'n hand hersien vertaling vir' n gegewe bron seting. Ons voorstel 'n eenvoudig nog effektief oplossing deur hierdie taak as 'n sequence-to-sequence taak te kasteer. In hierdie manier, ons stelsel uitvoer dekodering sonder eksplisiese begrense en maak volledige gebruik van hervergroot woorde vir beter vertaling voorskou. Eksperimentresultate vertoon dat BiTiIMT betekeurig beter en vinniger uitvoer as status-of-the-art LCD-gebaseerde IMT op drie vertalingstaak.", 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya mashine yenye asili ya ubongo (INMT) inaweza kuhakikisha tafsiri zenye sifa kubwa kwa kuchukua mahusiano ya binadamu kwenye hisabu. Mfumo wa IMT unaoendelea wanategemea kupanuka kwa kiwango cha lexico (LCD) unaweza kuwawezesha binadamu kutafsiri katika amri ya tafsiri yenye flexible beyond ya kushoto-to-kulia. Hata hivyo, kwa kawaida wanakabiliwa na vizuizi viwili muhimu katika ufanisi na ubora wa tafsiri kutokana na kutegemea kwa LCD. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa riwaya wa BiTIIMT, unaoandika maandishi ya Kiingereza kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa. Wazo muhimu kwa BiTIIMT ni kuandika maandishi ya Kibilingual (BiTI) ambalo linakusudia kuwajaza vipengele vilivyopotea katika tafsiri iliyoandikwa kwa mkono kwa ajili ya hukumu ya chanzo fulani. Tunazipendekeza suluhisho rahisi lakini yenye ufanisi kwa kutumia kazi hii kama kazi ya kufuatilia kwa mara nyingine. Kwa namna hii, mfumo wetu unafanya vikwazo bila vikwazo vya wazi na inatumia maneno mabadiliko kwa kutabiri bora ya tafsiri. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba BiTiIMT inafanya vizuri zaidi na haraka zaidi ya hali inayohusiana na IMT yenye asili ya sanaa ya LCD kwa kazi tatu za kutafsiri.', 'tr': 'İnsan täsirlerini görä terjime edip bilýär. Häzirki mehdutçilikli ködleme (LCD) üstine ýa şan IMT sistemleri adamlary fleksibil terjime terjime edilsin. Ýöne olar CD-de ynamlyk üçin adatça 2 möhüm hiletlerden çykýarlar. Bu işde, BiTIIMT sistemi, Bilingual Metin-Infilling Interaktiv Nural Maşynyň terjimesi üçin bir roman teklip edip bilýäris. BiTIIMT üçin a çyk ideýa Bilingual Metin-iňlemekdir Biz bu işi sequence-to-sequence işi ýazmak üçin basit bir täsirli çözümleri teklip edip görýäris. Bu şekilde biziň sistemamyz açyk çykyşlar bolmasa ködleme edip, gowurak terjime etmek üçin düzenlenen sözleri ulanýar. Testler netijesi BiTiIMT üç terjime edilen täzeliklerde möhüm we çalt işleýändigini görkez.', 'am': 'Interactive neural machine translation (INMT) is able to guarantee high-quality translations by taking human interaction into account. የአሁኑ IMT systems በመጠቀም ላይ የተጠቃሚ ግንኙነት (LCD) ክፍል ማድረግ በሚችል ሰው ለመtranslate in a flexible translation order beyond the left-to-right. However, they typically suffer from two significant limitations in translation efficiency and quality due to the reliance on LCD.  በዚህ ስራ፣ የቢቲIMT ስርዓት፣ የቋንቋዊ ጽሑፍ-Infilling ለInteractive Neural Machine ትርጉም እናስጀምራለን፡፡ የBiTIIMT የቁልፍ አሳብ ብልቋንቋዊ ጽሑፍ-infilling (BiTI) ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስራ በክፍለ ግንኙነት ለመስጠት የሚያስፈልገውን ቀላል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ እንደዚህ፣ ስርዓታችን ግልፅ ሳይኖር ግልጾችን ማድረግ ያደርጋል እናም የተሻለ ትርጉም ለመፍጠር የተሰናየውን ቃላት ለመጠቀም ይሞላል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ቢቲIMT በሦስት ትርጉም አድራጊዎች ላይ ከሀገር-የ-art LCD-based IMT በሚያሳየው ትርጉም የሚሻል እና ፈጥኖ እንዲያደርግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ինտերակտիվ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (INMT) կարողանում է համոզել բարձր որակի թարգմանությունները հաշվի առնելով մարդկային փոխազդեցությունները: Existing IMT systems relying on lexical constrained decoding (LCD) enable humans to translate in a flexible translation order beyond the left-to-right.  Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք սովորաբար տառապում են թարգմանման արդյունավետության և որակի երկու կարևոր սահմանափակումներից LCD-ի վրա կախվածության պատճառով: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ԲիՏԻՄԹ համակարգ, երկլեզու տեքստ-ինտերակտիվ նյարդային մեքենաների թարգմանման համար: ԲիՏԻՄԹ-ի գլխավոր գաղափարն այն է, որ երկլեզու տեքստի ներքևումն է (ԲիՏԻ), որը նպատակն է լցնել բացակայող սեգմերները ձեռքով վերափոխված թարգմանումներում տվյալ աղբյուր նախադասության համար: Մենք առաջարկում ենք պարզ, բայց արդյունավետ լուծում, այս խնդիրը որպես հաջորդականություն-հաջորդականություն: Այսպես, մեր համակարգը կատարում է կոդավորումը առանց բացատրական սահմանափակումների և օգտագործում է վերականգնված բառերը ավելի լավ թարգմանման կանխատեսման համար: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ԲիՏԻՄԹ-ը ավելի լավ և ավելի արագ է աշխատում, քան լավագույն LCD-ով հիմնված ինտերնետային տեխնոլոգիաները երեք թարգմանման խնդիրներում:', 'bn': 'ইন্টারেক্টিভ নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদ (ইনিএমটি) মানুষের মানুষের ইন্টারনেকশন হিসেবে নিশ্চিত করে উচ্চ মান অনুবাদ নি বাম- থেকে ডানদিকের বাইরে একটি ফ্ল্যাক্সিবল অনুবাদ অনুবাদ অনুবাদের অনুবাদে মানুষের বিদ্যমান IMT সিস্টেম নির্ভর করে। তবে এলসিডির উপর নির্ভর করার কারণে সাধারণত তারা অনুবাদের দক্ষতা এবং মানের দুটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সীমাবদ্ধ দুটি সী এই কাজে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস বিটিআইএমটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করছি, বিলিঙ্গুয়েল টেক্সট-ইন্ফিলিং ইন্টারেক্টিভ নেউরাল মেশিন অনু বিটিআইএমটির প্রধান ধারণা হচ্ছে বিলিঙ্গুয়েল টেক্সট- ইনফাইন্লিং (বিটিআই) যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি প্রদত্ত উৎসের বাক্যের জন্য হাতে  আমরা এই কাজের মাধ্যমে একটি সাধারণ কার্যকর সমাধানের প্রস্তাব করছি যেটা সেকেন্স থেকে ক্রমাগত কাজ হিসেবে। এভাবে আমাদের সিস্টেম স্পষ্ট বাধ্যতা ছাড়া ডিকোডিং করে এবং ভালো অনুবাদের ভবিষ্যতের জন্য সুস্পষ্ট শব্দ ব্যবহার করে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বিটিআইএমটি তিনটি অনুবাদ কাজের উপর ভিত্তিক এলসিডির রাষ্ট্রের থেকে অনেক ভালো এবং তাড়াতাড়ি করে।', 'ca': "Interactive neural machine translation (INMT) is able to guarantee high-quality translations by taking human interactions into account.  Els sistemes IMT existents basats en la descodificació lècsica restringida (LCD) permeten als humans traduir-se en un ordre flexible de traducció més enllà de l'esquerra a la dreta. Però normalment pateixen dues limitacions significatives en l'eficiència i la qualitat de la traducció degut a la confiança en LCD. En aquest treball, proposem un nou sistema BiTIIMT, Infilling-Text Bilingual for Interactive Neural Machine Translation. La idea clau del BiTIIMT és l'infiltració bilingüe del text (BiTI) que té por omplir segments que falten en una traducció revisada manualment per una frase de font dada. Proposem una solució senzilla però efectiva posant aquesta tasca com a tasca seqüència a seqüència. D'aquesta manera, el nostre sistema fa decodificació sense restriccions explícites i utilitza plenament paraules revisades per a millor predicció de traducció. Els resultats d'experiments demostren que BiTiIMT actua molt millor i més ràpid que l'IMT basat en LCD d'última generació en tres tasques de traducció.", 'az': 'İnsanların əlaqələrini hesablayaraq yüksək kaliteli tercümələri garantiya edə bilər. Ləsksik müəyyən edilmiş kodlama (LCD) ilə bağlı IMT sistemləri insanların sol-sağa öyrənməsi üçün fleksib tercümə sırasında tercümə etməsini fəallaşdırır. Lakin onlar LCD təvəkküllənməsinə görə dəyişiklik və keyfiyyət üçün iki mövcuddur sınırlardan əziyyət çəkirlər. Bu işdə, biz yeni BiTIIMT sistemini, interaktif nöral maşın çevirilməsi üçün ikinci Metin-Infilling təklif edirik. BiTIIMT üçün anahtar ideyası, verilən mənbə cümləsi üçün əlli dəyişdirilmiş segmentləri doldurmaq niyyətindədir. Biz bu işi sequence-to-sequence işi olaraq asanlıqla etkili bir çözüm təklif edirik. Bu yolda, sistemimiz açıq müəyyən edilmədən kodlandırmağı və daha yaxşı tercümə tədbir üçün yenilənmiş sözləri tamamlayır. Təcrübə sonuçları BiTiIMT üç çevirim işində olan LCD-ə dayanan IMT-dən daha yaxşı və daha hızlı işlədiyini göstərir.', 'bs': 'Interaktivni prevod neuralnih strojeva (INMT) može garantirati prevod kvalitete uzimajući u obzir ljudske interakcije. Postojeći IMT sistemi koji se oslanjaju na leksički ograničeni dekodiranje (LCD) omogućavaju ljudima prevoditi u fleksibilnom redosljedu prevoda izvan lijeve na desno. Međutim, oni obično pate od dva značajna ograničenja učinkovitosti i kvalitete prevođenja zbog pouzdanosti na LCD. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi sistem BiTIIMT, Bilingualni tekst-Infilling za interaktivnu neuronsku prevodu mašine. Ključna ideja za BiTIIMT je dvostruka uvlačenja teksta (BiTI) koja cilja napuniti nestale segmente u manualno revidiranom prevodu za određenu izvornu rečenicu. Predlažemo jednostavno, ali efikasno rješenje bacajući ovaj zadatak kao zadatak sekvence do sekvence. Na taj način, naš sistem provodi dekodiranje bez objašnjih ograničenja i potpuno koristi revidirane riječi za bolje predviđanje prevoda. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da BiTiIMT izvodi značajno bolje i brže od stanja umjetne LCD-based IMT na tri prevodne zadatke.', 'cs': 'Interaktivní neuronový strojový překlad (INMT) je schopen zaručit vysoce kvalitní překlady s ohledem na lidské interakce. Stávající systémy IMT spoléhající na lexikálně omezené dekódování (LCD) umožňují lidem překládat v flexibilním překladovém pořadí mimo zleva doprava. Obvykle však trpí dvěma významnými omezeními efektivity a kvality překladu kvůli závislosti na LCD. V této práci navrhujeme nový BiTIIMT systém, dvojjazyčné textové doplňování pro interaktivní neuronový strojový překlad. Klíčovou myšlenkou BiTIIMT je dvojjazyčné textové doplnění (BiTI), které má za cíl vyplnit chybějící segmenty v ručně revidovaném překladu dané zdrojové věty. Navrhujeme jednoduché, ale efektivní řešení použitím tohoto úkolu jako úkolu sekvence na sekvenci. Tímto způsobem náš systém provádí dekódování bez explicitních omezení a plně využívá revidovaná slova pro lepší predikci překladu. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že BiTiIMT při třech překladatelských úlohách funguje výrazně lepší a rychlejší než moderní LCD IMT.', 'fi': 'Interaktiivinen neurokonekäännös (INMT) takaa laadukkaat käännökset ottamalla huomioon ihmisten vuorovaikutukset. Nykyiset, leksikaaliseen rajoitettuun dekoodaukseen (LCD) perustuvat IMT-järjestelmät mahdollistavat kääntämisen joustavassa käännösjärjestyksessä vasemmalta oikealle. Ne kärsivät kuitenkin tyypillisesti kahdesta merkittävästä käännöstehokkuuden ja laadun rajoituksesta, jotka johtuvat nestekidenäytön käytöstä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta BiTIIMT-järjestelmää, kaksikielistä tekstitäyttöä interaktiiviseen neurokääntämiseen. BiTIIMTin keskeinen idea on kaksikielinen tekstitäyttö (BiTI), jonka tavoitteena on täyttää puuttuvat segmentit manuaalisesti tarkistetussa käännöksessä tietylle lähdelauseelle. Ehdotamme yksinkertaista mutta tehokasta ratkaisua heittämällä tämän tehtävän sekvenssi-sekvenssiin tehtäväksi. Tällä tavoin järjestelmämme suorittaa dekoodauksen ilman nimenomaisia rajoituksia ja hyödyntää täysin tarkistettuja sanoja paremman käännöksen ennustamisen. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että BiTiimt suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin ja nopeammin kuin huipputekninen LCD-pohjainen IMT kolmessa käännöstehtävässä.', 'et': 'Interaktiivne neuraalne masintõlge (INMT) suudab tagada kvaliteetsed tõlked, võttes arvesse inimeste interaktsioone. Olemasolevad leksikaalsele piiratud dekodeerimisele (LCD) tuginevad IMT-süsteemid võimaldavad inimestel tõlkida paindlikus tõlkejärjekorras vasakult paremale. Siiski kannatavad nad tavaliselt kahe märkimisväärse tõlketõhususe ja kvaliteedi piirangu tõttu, kuna nad sõltuvad LCD-ist. Selles töös pakume välja uudse BiTIIMT süsteemi, kahekeelse teksti täitmise interaktiivseks neuromasintõlkeks. BiTIIMTi peamine idee on kahekeelse teksti täitmine (BiTI), mille eesmärk on täita puuduvad segmendid käsitsi muudetud tõlkes antud alglause jaoks. Me pakume välja lihtsa, kuid tõhusa lahenduse, valades selle ülesande jadast järjestusse ülesandeks. Sel viisil teeb meie süsteem dekodeerimise ilma selgete piiranguteta ja kasutab täielikult läbivaadatud sõnu paremaks tõlkeprognoosimiseks. Katsetulemused näitavad, et BiTiimt toimib kolme tõlketöö puhul oluliselt paremini ja kiiremini kui kaasaegne LCD-põhine IMT.', 'jv': 'Name translation" means "shift Nanging, wong sedhaya punika dipunangé kabèh dumadhi kayané kabèh perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo kaliwat karo ngregani luwih-luwih sabên. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita supoyo kuwi nyumbang BiTIEMT sistem, Bilingual Text-Infoilling kanggo interactive Neral Masjin Terjamahan. BiTITITI Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem akeh luwih akeh basa dadi cast kuwi nggawe ngupakan-nggawe dadi sekondirno-to-sekondirno dadi. buddy Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "translation KCharselect unicode block name Amma kuma, a kawaici, suna cũtar wa tsaro biyu mai girma cikin fassarar fassarar fassarar da baƙata saboda da aka dõgara ga LCd. @ action: button @ item: inmenu Kayyar da kafin aiki mai sauƙi ko da mai amfani da kuma za mu jẽfa wannan aiki kamar wani aiki na dabam-dabam. Kamar wannan, na'urarmu yana tafiyar da kodi ko kuma ba da wata ƙunci ba mai bayyanãwa ba, kuma yana cika amfani da magana wanda aka kure wa zaman shawarar da kuma mafi kyaun fassarar. Jarrayen jarrabãwa na nuna cewa BiTiIMT na aikata significant alhẽri kuma da gaggawa daga state-of-the-art LCD-based on IMT na fassarar aiki uku.", 'sk': 'Interaktivni nevronski strojni prevod (INMT) zagotavlja visokokakovostne prevode z upoštevanjem človeških interakcij. Obstoječi sistemi IMT, ki se opirajo na leksikalno omejeno dekodiranje (LCD), omogočajo ljudem, da prevajajo v fleksibilnem vrstnem redu preko leve proti desni. Vendar pa zaradi zanašanja na LCD običajno trpijo dve pomembni omejitvi učinkovitosti in kakovosti prevajanja. V tem delu predlagamo nov BiTIIMT sistem, dvojezično polnjenje besedila za interaktivno živčno strojno prevajanje. Ključna ideja BiTIIMT je dvojezično polnjenje besedila (BiTI), katerega cilj je zapolniti manjkajoče segmente v ročno revidiranem prevodu za določen izvorni stavek. Predlagamo preprosto, vendar učinkovito rešitev, tako da to nalogo naložimo kot nalogo od zaporedja do zaporedja. Na ta način naš sistem izvaja dekodiranje brez izrecnih omejitev in popolnoma uporablja revidirane besede za boljše napovedovanje prevodov. Rezultati eksperimentov kažejo, da je BiTiimt bistveno boljši in hitrejši od najsodobnejšega IMT na osnovi LCD pri treh prevajalskih nalogah.', 'he': 'תורגם על ידי מכונת עצבית אינטראקטיבית (INMT) מסוגלת להבטיח תורגם איכות גבוהה על ידי לקחת בחשבון אינטראקציות אנושיות. מערכות IMT קיימות מסתמכות על פיקוד מוגבלת לקסית (LCD) מאפשרות לבני אדם לתרגם בסדר תרגום גמיש מעבר לשמאל לימין. בכל אופן, הם סובלים בדרך כלל משני מגבלות משמעותיות ביעילות ותרגום ואיכות בגלל תלויה על LCD. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מערכת BiTIIMT חדשה, משפילת טקסט משולשת לתרגום מכונת נוירולית אינטראקטיבית. הרעיון המפתח של BiTIIMT הוא פיצוץ טקסט משולש (BiTI) שמתכוון למלא חלקים חסרים בתרגום משורך ידנית למקור מסוים. אנו מציעים פתרון פשוט אך יעיל על ידי הטילת המשימה הזאת בתור משימה רצף לרצף. בדרך זו, המערכת שלנו מבצעת פיקוד ללא מחסומות ברורות ומשתמשת במלוא במילים משופעות לחזות תרגום טובה יותר. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שBiTiIMT מבצע טוב יותר ומהיר במיוחד מאשר IMT המבוסס על LCD מוקדם ביותר על שלושה משימות תרגום.', 'bo': 'Interactive neural machine translation (INMT) is able to guarantee high-quality translations by taking human interactions into account. Existing IMT systems relying on lexical constrained decoding (LCD) enable humans to translate in a flexible translation order beyond the left-to-right. ཡིན་ནའང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། འོད་ཀྱང་འོད་སྡེར་བརྟེན་རྟོན་རུང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཆེན་པོ་གཉིས་ལས་གནོད་པ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་ལུ་ BiTIIMT་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་དང་ Bilingual Text-Infilling for Interactive Neural Machine Translation་ལ་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། The key idea to BiTIIMT is Bilingual Text-infilling (BiTI) which aims to fill missing segments in a manually revised translation for a given source sentence. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་བ་འདི་ལྟར་རྗེས་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བའི་སྟབས་བདེ་ཤིག་གི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟར། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་གསལ Experiment results show that BiTiIMT performs significantly better and faster than state-of-the-art LCD-based IMT on translation tasks three.'}
{'en': 'Knowledge Neurons in Pretrained Transformers', 'fr': 'Réglage précis du BERT robuste sur le plan de la distribution pour la dérive des covariables dans la compréhension de la langue parlée', 'pt': 'BERT de ajuste fino distribucionalmente robusto para deriva covariável na compreensão da linguagem falada', 'ar': 'توزيع BERT قوي للضبط التوزيعي للانجراف المتغير في فهم اللغة المنطوقة', 'es': 'BERT de ajuste fino distribucionalmente robusto para la deriva covariable en la comprensión del lenguaje hablado', 'ja': '口語理解における共変ドリフトのための分布的に堅牢な細かい調整BERT', 'zh': '分布鲁棒性微调 BERT,口语协变量漂移', 'hi': 'वितरण रूप से मजबूत Finetuning BERT बोली जाने वाली भाषा समझ में Covariate बहाव के लिए', 'ru': 'Дистрибутивно надежная точная настройка BERT для ковариатного дрейфа в понимании разговорного языка', 'ga': 'Mionchoigeartú Dáilte Láidir le haghaidh Comhvariate Drift i dTuisceana Teanga Labhartha', 'hu': 'Forgalmazási szempontból robusztus BERT finomítása a beszélt nyelvek megértésére', 'el': 'Διανεμητικά στιβαρή τελειοποίηση για την ομοιογενή διακίνηση στην κατανόηση της ομιλούμενης γλώσσας', 'lt': 'Pasiskirstymo požiūriu patikimas aptikimas BERT, skirtas „Covariate Drift“ kalbos supratimu', 'it': 'BERT Finetuning robusto a livello distributivo per la deriva Covariata nella comprensione della lingua parlata', 'ms': 'BERT untuk Covariate Drift dalam Pemahaman Bahasa Bercakap', 'mk': 'Дирибуционално силно откривање BERT за Covariate Drift во разговорно јазичко разбирање', 'ml': 'സ്പോക്കിന്റെ ഭാഷയിലെ കോവറിയേറ്റ് ഡ്രൈഫ്റ്റിന് വേണ്ടി ബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ വിതരണം ചെയ്യുന്ന റോബസ്റ്റ്', 'mt': 'Twaqqif Distribuzzjonalment robust BERT għal Covariate Drift fil-Ftehim tal-Lingwa Spoken', 'ka': 'პარაბსტიურად Robust Finetuning BERT-ს კოგარიატური ექსპერტის შესახებ', 'mn': 'Холбоотой хэлний ойлголтын Covariate Drift-д Робст Финутунин BERT', 'kk': 'Тілдерді түсіну үшін Ковариат дрифт үшін Робуст Финтунин BERT', 'pl': 'Dystrybucyjnie solidne finetuning BERT dla kowariatnego dryfu w rozumieniu języka mówionego', 'ro': 'Finetuning BERT robust din punct de vedere distribuțional pentru deranjul Covariat în înțelegerea limbilor vorbite', 'sr': 'Distribucionalno robust Finetuning BERT za kovariate Drift u razumijevanju govornog jezika', 'so': 'Qayb ahaan Finnishka BERT ee Covariate Drive afka Finnishka Understanding', 'si': 'ස්පොකෙන් භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න කෝවිරියේට් ඩ්\u200dරිෆ්ට් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය හොයාගන්න BERT', 'sv': 'Distributionellt robust Finetuning BERT för Covariate Drift i talad språkförståelse', 'no': 'Distribusjonell Robust Finetuning BERT for Covariate Drift i Spoken Language Understanding', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'اسپاک زبان سمجھنے میں Covariate Drift کے لئے تقسیم کے طور پر Robust Finetuning BERT', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bài tập về máy phát ngôn ngữ học', 'da': 'Distributionelt robust Finetuning BERT til Covariate Drift i talesprogforståelse', 'hr': 'Distribucionally robust Finetuning BERT for Covariate Drift in Spoken Language Understanding', 'bg': 'Дистрибуционално здраво финатуниране на БРТ за ковариатно дрифт в говореното езиково разбиране', 'de': 'Distributionell robustes Finetuning BERT für kovariate Drift im Sprachverständnis', 'ko': '구어 이해 중 협동 변수 표류의 분포 루봉 정밀 조정 BERT', 'nl': 'Distributioneel robuuste finetuning BERT voor covariate drift in gesproken taal begrijpen', 'fa': 'به طور توسعه استوار فینتونینگ BERT برای رانندگی Covariate Drift در درک زبان Spoken', 'sw': 'Kigawanyo cha Kupata BERT kwa ajili ya Kupima Harakati katika Lugha ya Utetezi', 'tr': 'Döwletlerde Robust Finetuning BERT Spok Dilinde Covariate Drift üçin', 'id': 'Distributionally Robust Finetuning BERT for Covariate Drift in Spoken Language Understanding', 'am': 'Understanding', 'hy': 'Խոսվող լեզվի ընկալումը', 'af': 'Distributionally Robust Finetuning BERT for Covariate Drift in Spoken Language Understanding', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i fuqishëm shpërndarës BERT për dritën e Covariate në kuptimin e gjuhës së folur', 'bn': 'Name', 'az': 'Sözlük dil anlayışında Covariate Drift üçün səbəbdən robust Finetuning BERT', 'ca': 'Findings Distributionally Robust BERT for Covariate Drift in Spoken Language Understanding', 'bs': 'Distribucionalno robust Finetuning BERT za kovariate Drift u razumijevanju govornog jezika', 'cs': 'Distributivně robustní finetuning BERT pro kovariátní drift v porozumění mluvenému jazyce', 'et': 'Jaoturult vastupidav BERT-i rafineerimine kõneleva keele mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'BERT:n hajautetusti kestävä finetuniinti kovariaattidriftille puhutun kielen ymmärtämisessä', 'jv': 'Distribution', 'sk': 'Distribucijsko robustno finetuniranje BERT za kovariatni drift v govorjenem jeziku', 'ha': 'Underline', 'he': 'הסיום החזק בצורה מתפשטת BERT עבור כיוון Covariate בהבנה של שפה מדברת', 'bo': 'Distributionally Robust Finetuning BERT for Covariate Drift in Spoken Language Understanding'}
{'en': 'Large scale pretrained language models are surprisingly good at recalling factual knowledge presented in the training corpus In this paper we present preliminary studies on how factual knowledge is stored in pretrained Transformers by introducing the concept of knowledge neurons Specifically we examine the fill in the blank cloze task for BERT Given a relational fact we propose a knowledge attribution method to identify the neurons that express the fact We find that the activation of such knowledge neurons is positively correlated to the expression of their corresponding facts In our case studies we attempt to leverage knowledge neurons to edit such as update and erase specific factual knowledge without fine tuning Our results shed light on understanding the storage of knowledge within pretrained Transformers', 'ar': 'في هذه الدراسة ، نحقق في المتانة ضد الانجراف المتغير في فهم اللغة المنطوقة (SLU). يمكن أن يحدث الانجراف المتغير في SLU\nعندما يكون هناك انحراف بين التدريب والاختبار فيما يتعلق بما يطلبه المستخدمون أو كيف يطلبونه. لدراسة هذا ، نقترح طريقة تستغل الاختلافات الطبيعية في البيانات لإنشاء انجراف متغير في مجموعات بيانات SLU. تظهر التجارب أن نموذجًا متطورًا قائمًا على BERT يعاني من فقدان الأداء في ظل هذا الانجراف. للتخفيف من فقدان الأداء ، نقوم بالتحقيق في التحسين القوي التوزيعي (DRO) لضبط النماذج المستندة إلى BERT. نناقش بعض طرق DRO الحديثة ، ونقترح متغيرين جديدين ونبين بشكل تجريبي أن DRO يحسن المتانة تحت الانجراف.', 'fr': "Dans cette étude, nous étudions la robustesse contre la dérive des covariables dans la compréhension du langage parlé (SLU). Une dérive de covariable peut se produire dans le SLU\nlorsqu'il y a une dérive entre la formation et les tests en ce qui concerne ce que les utilisateurs demandent ou comment ils le demandent. Pour étudier cela, nous proposons une méthode qui exploite les variations naturelles des données afin de créer une dérive de covariable dans les ensembles de données SLU. Les expériences montrent qu'un modèle de pointe basé sur BERT subit une perte de performance sous cette dérive. Pour atténuer la perte de performance, nous étudions l'optimisation distributionnellement robuste (DRO) pour affiner les modèles basés sur BERT. Nous discutons de certaines méthodes récentes de DRO, proposons deux nouvelles variantes et montrons empiriquement que la DRO améliore la robustesse sous dérive.", 'pt': 'Neste estudo, investigamos a robustez contra a deriva covariável na compreensão da linguagem falada (SLU). A deriva covariável pode ocorrer em SLU\nquando há um desvio entre o treinamento e o teste em relação ao que os usuários solicitam ou como eles solicitam. Para estudar isso, propomos um método que explora variações naturais nos dados para criar uma deriva covariável em conjuntos de dados SLU. Experimentos mostram que um modelo baseado em BERT de última geração sofre perda de desempenho sob esse desvio. Para mitigar a perda de desempenho, investigamos a otimização robusta de distribuição (DRO) para ajustar modelos baseados em BERT. Discutimos alguns métodos DRO recentes, propomos duas novas variantes e mostramos empiricamente que DRO melhora a robustez sob deriva.', 'es': 'En este estudio, investigamos la robustez contra la deriva covariable en la comprensión del lenguaje oral (SLU). La deriva de la covariable puede ocurrir en SLU\ncuando hay una diferencia entre el entrenamiento y las pruebas con respecto a lo que los usuarios solicitan o cómo lo solicitan. Para estudiar esto, proponemos un método que explota las variaciones naturales en los datos para crear una deriva covariable en los conjuntos de datos de SLU. Los experimentos muestran que un modelo basado en Bert de última generación sufre una pérdida de rendimiento bajo esta deriva. Para mitigar la pérdida de rendimiento, investigamos la optimización sólida distribucionalmente (DRO) para ajustar los modelos basados en BERT. Discutimos algunos métodos recientes de DRO, proponemos dos nuevas variantes y demostramos empíricamente que DRO mejora la robustez en caso de deriva.', 'ja': 'この研究では、口語理解（ ＳＬＵ ）における共変量ドリフトに対する堅牢性を調査した。 SLUでは共変量ドリフトが発生する可能性があります\nユーザーが何を要求するか、どのように要求するかについて、トレーニングとテストの間にずれがある場合。 これを検討するために、データの自然変動を利用して、SLUデータセットの共変量ドリフトを作成する方法を提案します。 実験では、最先端のBERTベースのモデルは、このドリフトの下でパフォーマンス損失を被ることが示されています。 パフォーマンスの損失を軽減するために、BERTベースのモデルを微調整するための分布堅牢最適化（ DRO ）を調査します。 最近のいくつかのDRO法について議論し、2つの新しいバリアントを提案し、DROがドリフト下での堅牢性を改善することを実証的に示します。', 'hi': 'इस अध्ययन में, हम बोली जाने वाली भाषा की समझ (एसएलयू) में कोवरिएट बहाव के खिलाफ मजबूती की जांच करते हैं। SLU में कोवरिएट बहाव हो सकता है\nजब प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण के बीच एक बहाव होता है कि उपयोगकर्ता क्या अनुरोध करते हैं या वे इसका अनुरोध कैसे करते हैं। इसका अध्ययन करने के लिए हम एक ऐसी विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एसएलयू डेटासेट में एक कोवरिएट बहाव बनाने के लिए डेटा में प्राकृतिक विविधताओं का शोषण करती है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि एक अत्याधुनिक BERT-आधारित मॉडल इस बहाव के तहत प्रदर्शन हानि का सामना करता है। प्रदर्शन हानि को कम करने के लिए, हम BERT-आधारित मॉडल को ठीक करने के लिए वितरण रूप से मजबूत अनुकूलन (DRO) की जांच करते हैं। हम कुछ हाल के डीआरओ तरीकों पर चर्चा करते हैं, दो नए रूपों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और अनुभवजन्य रूप से दिखाते हैं कि डीआरओ बहाव के तहत मजबूती में सुधार करता है।', 'ru': 'В этом исследовании мы исследуем устойчивость против ковариатного дрейфа в понимании разговорного языка (SLU). В SLU может произойти ковариатный дрейф\nкогда существует разрыв между обучением и тестированием в отношении того, что пользователи запрашивают или как они запрашивают. Для изучения этого мы предлагаем метод, который использует естественные вариации в данных для создания дрейфа ковариат в наборах данных SLU. Эксперименты показывают, что современная модель на основе BERT терпит потерю производительности при этом дрейфе. Чтобы уменьшить потери производительности, мы исследуем распределенно надежную оптимизацию (DRO) для тонкой настройки моделей на основе BERT. Мы обсуждаем некоторые недавние методы DRO, предлагаем два новых варианта и эмпирически показываем, что DRO улучшает устойчивость при дрейфе.', 'zh': '于此论之,口语解(SLU)协变量漂移之鲁棒性。 协变量漂移,或在 SLU 中\n当训试之间用户请请偏差。 为此一法,用数之变SLU集协变量漂移。 实验明漂移之下,先进之BERT,则性失矣。 所以轻性能损,究 BERT 之分布鲁棒优化 (DRO)。 论近DRO之法,建二新之变体,以明DRO重移下之鲁棒性。', 'ga': 'Sa staidéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar stóinseacht in aghaidh an tsrutha comhvariate i dtuiscint na teanga labhartha (SLU). Is féidir le sruth covariate tarlú i SLU\nnuair a bhíonn athrú idir oiliúint agus tástáil maidir leis an méid a iarrann úsáideoirí nó conas a iarrann siad é. Chun staidéar a dhéanamh air seo molaimid modh a bhaineann leas as éagsúlachtaí nádúrtha i sonraí chun sruth comhvariate a chruthú i dtacar sonraí SLU. Léiríonn turgnaimh go gcailltear feidhmíocht samhail úrscothach atá bunaithe ar BERT faoin sruth seo. Chun an caillteanas feidhmíochta a mhaolú, déanaimid imscrúdú ar bharrfheabhsú láidir dáileacháin (DRO) chun samhlacha bunaithe ar BERT a mhionchoigeartú. Déanaimid plé ar roinnt modhanna DRO le déanaí, molaimid dhá leagan nua agus léirímid go heimpíreach go bhfeabhsaítear stóinseacht an DRO nuair a bhíonn sí ag imeacht.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα μελέτη, διερευνούμε την ανθεκτικότητα κατά της συμπαραγωγής στην κατανόηση της προφορικής γλώσσας (SLU). Μπορεί να προκύψει ομοιογενής μετατόπιση σε SLU', 'it': 'In questo studio, esaminiamo la robustezza contro la deriva covariata nella comprensione della lingua parlata (SLU). La deriva Covariata può verificarsi in SLU', 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеулерде, қовариатты тілді түсініктеріне (SLU) қарсы құндылығын зерттейміз. Ковариат дрифт SLU- де болуы мүмкін', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a beszélt nyelv megértésében (SLU) bekövetkező kovariáns sodródással szembeni robusztusságot vizsgálunk. Kováriás sodródás fordulhat elő az SLU-ban', 'lt': 'In this study, we investigate robustness against covariate drift in spoken language understanding (SLU).  Gali pasireikšti sluoksniuotojo sluoksnio sluoksniuotojo sluoksniuotojo sluoksniuotojo sluoksniuotojo sluoksniuotojo sluoksniuotojo sluoksniuotojo sluoksniuota', 'ms': 'Dalam kajian ini, kami menyelidiki kekuatan terhadap pemahaman bahasa bercakap (SLU). Pemindahan Covariate boleh berlaku dalam SLU', 'ka': 'ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ძალიან ძალიან კოგარიატური სტრიფტის შესახებ სიტყვების შესახებ (SLU). Name', 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d, സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയിലെ വിവേചനത്തിനെതിരായുള്ള കോവേറിറ്റ് ഫ്രിഫ്റ്റിനെതിരെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d  SLU-ല്\u200d കോവറിയേറ്റ് ഡ്രിഫ്റ്റ് സംഭവിക്കാം.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд бид хэлний ойлголт (SLU) дээр зориулсан хүчирхийлэл эсрэг хүчтэй байдлыг судалж байна. СЛУ-д ковариат завсарлага явж болно.', 'mt': 'F’dan l-istudju, ninvestigaw ir-robustezza kontra d-drift kovarjat fil-fehim tal-lingwa mitkellma (SLU). Tista’ sseħħ drift ta’ kopertura f’SLU', 'ro': 'În acest studiu, investigăm robustețea împotriva derivei covariate în înțelegerea limbii vorbite (SLU). Deviziunea covariată poate apărea în SLU', 'no': 'I denne studien undersøker vi kraftighet mot kovariatdrift i språkkforståelse (SLU). Covariate drift kan skje i SLU', 'sr': 'U ovom istraživanju istražujemo robustnost protiv kovarijatnog drifa u razumevanju govornog jezika (SLU). Može se pojaviti kovarijatni drift u SLU-u', 'mk': 'Во оваа студија, ние ја истражуваме силноста против коваријатските движења во разбирањето на зборуваниот јазик (СЛУ). Коваријатен дрифт може да се случи во SLU', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි කොවාරියාට් ඩ්\u200dරිෆ්ට් එක්ක ශක්තිමත් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කතා කරපු භාෂාව තේරු SLU වල කෝවරියේට් ඩ්\u200dරිෆ්ට් වෙන්න පුළුවන්', 'so': 'Waxbarashadan waxaynu baaritaan waxyaabaha ka geesta ah qalabka kala duwan ee ku qoran waxgarashada afka (SLU). Xafiiska qoyska waxaa ka dhici kara SLU', 'sv': 'I denna studie undersöker vi robusthet mot kovariat drift i talad språkförståelse (SLU). Covariatdrift kan förekomma i SLU', 'ta': 'In this study, we investigate robustness against covariate drift in spoken language understanding (SLU).  Name', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu badamy solidność wobec współzmiennego dryfu w rozumieniu języka mówionego (SLU). W SLU może wystąpić dryf wspólny', 'ur': 'اس پڑھنے میں ہم زبان سمجھانے کے ساتھ محبت کے خلاف سختی کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں۔ SLU میں کوویریٹ ڈریفوٹ ہو سکتا ہے', 'uz': "Bu tadqida, biz gapiradigan tilni tushunish (SLU) haqida o'zgarishni o'rganamiz. Name", 'vi': 'Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu độ bền chống lại sự di chuyển của nhiệt độ trong ngôn ngữ nói (SLU). Có thể có chuyển đi của Covariate trong LAU', 'bg': 'В това проучване изследваме здравината срещу ковариатното отклонение в говореното езиково разбиране (СЛУ). Ковариатно дрифт може да възникне в SLU', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju istražujemo jačinu protiv kovariata u razumijevanju govornog jezika (SLU). Kovarijatni drift može se pojaviti u SLU-u', 'da': 'I dette studie undersøger vi robusthed mod kovariat drift i talt sprogforståelse (SLU). Covariat drift kan forekomme i SLU', 'nl': 'In deze studie onderzoeken we robuustheid tegen covariate drift in gesproken taal begrip (SLU). Covariate drift kan optreden in SLU', 'de': 'In dieser Studie untersuchen wir Robustheit gegen Kovariate Drift im Sprachverständnis (SLU). Kovariate Drift kann in SLU auftreten', 'id': 'Dalam penelitian ini, kami menyelidiki kekuatan terhadap drift kovarian dalam pemahaman bahasa berbicara (SLU). Pemindahan Covariate dapat terjadi dalam SLU', 'ko': '이 연구에서 우리는 구어이해(SLU)에서 항협 변수 표류의 안정성을 연구했다.SLU에서 변수 이동이 발생할 수 있음', 'fa': 'در این مطالعه، ما در مقابل استواری در درک زبان صحبت (SLU) تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. در SLU می\u200cتواند دریفت کوواریات اتفاق بیفتد', 'sw': 'Katika utafiti huu, tunachunguza ubakaji dhidi ya ubaguzi wa tofauti katika uelewa wa lugha inayozungumzwa (SLU). Utafiti wa habari unaweza kutokea SLU', 'tr': "Bu okuw챌yda biz s철zle힊첵채n dil d체힊체n체힊inde kawariat s체r체jilerine gar힊y ukyplygy barla첵arys. SLU'da k철wari힊 sowgat bolup biler", 'af': 'In hierdie studie, ondersoek ons kragtigheid teen kovariate drift in praat taal verstanding (SLU). Covariate drift kan voorkom in SLU', 'sq': 'Në këtë studim, ne hetojmë fuqinë kundër driftimit kovarian në kuptimin e gjuhës së folur (SLU). Mund të ndodhë lëvizja e Covariate në SLU', 'am': 'በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ማስተዋል (SLU) የሚቃወሙትን ፍላጎት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ undo-type', 'hy': 'In this study, we investigate robustness against covariate drift in spoken language understanding (SLU).  Կովարիատ պրոֆիլմը կարող է տեղի ունենալ', 'az': "Bu təhsil içində, söylədiyimiz dil anlayışında covariat drift'in əleyhinə sərtlik təhsil edirik. Cənnətdə Cənnətdə", 'bn': 'এই গবেষণায় আমরা ভাষায় ভাষা বুঝতে পারি কোভারেট ড্রিফটের বিরুদ্ধে রাস্তার বিরুদ্ধে তদন্ত করি। SLU-এ কভারিয়েট ড্রিফট ঘটতে পারে', 'cs': 'V této studii zkoumáme robustnost proti kovariatnímu driftu v porozumění mluvenému jazyce (SLU). V SLU může dojít ke kovariátnímu driftu', 'bs': 'U ovom ispitivanju istražujemo robustnost protiv kovariata u razumijevanju govornog jezika (SLU). Kovarijatni drift može se pojaviti u SLU-u', 'ca': 'En aquest estudi, investigam la robustetat contra el moviment covariat en la comprensió del llenguatge parlat (SLU). La derivació de la cobertura pot ocorrer a SLU', 'et': 'Käesolevas uuringus uuritakse tugevust kõneleva keele mõistmise (SLU) covariate triivi vastu. SLU-s võib esineda kovariaatne triiv', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa tutkitaan vastustuskykyä kovariaattidriftaa vastaan puhutun kielen ymmärtämisessä (SLU). SLU:ssa voi esiintyä kovariaattiajautumista', 'jv': 'Nang ujaran iki, awak dhéwé sakjane perbudhakan langkung rawut karo sakjane kanggo langgar. Sampeyan CoVariate', 'sk': 'V tej študiji smo raziskali robustnost proti kovariatnemu driftu v razumevanju govorjenega jezika (SLU). V SLU se lahko pojavi kororiatni drift', 'he': 'במחקר הזה, אנו חוקרים את החזקה נגד התנועה קובריאטית בהבנת שפה מדברת (SLU). התנועה קובריאטית יכולה להתרחש בסל"א', 'bo': 'ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྨན་གཞུང་དང་། སྨྲ་བརྗོད་པའི་ཆ་རྩལ་བའི་སྒུལ་ཤུགས་དང་། Covariate drift can occur in SLU', 'ha': 'Ina cikin wannan lõkaci, Munã yin ƙidãya a kanzu-kanzu ta cikin fassarar harshe da aka faɗa (SLU). QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu'}
{'en': 'Few-Shot Learning with ', 'ar': 'تعزيز نموذج اللغة الصينية المدربة مسبقًا من خلال الرسم البياني للغويات غير المتجانسة', 'fr': 'Amélioration du modèle linguistique chinois pré-entraîné via un graphe linguistique hétérogène', 'es': 'Mejora del modelo lingüístico chino preentrenado a través de gráficos lingüísticos heterogéneos', 'pt': 'Aprimorando o modelo de idioma pré-treinado chinês por meio do gráfico de linguística heterogênea', 'ja': '異種言語学グラフを介した中国語事前トレーニング言語モデルの強化', 'zh': '因异构语言学图增汉语预训习语言模样', 'hi': 'विषम भाषाविज्ञान ग्राफ के माध्यम से चीनी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को बढ़ाना', 'ru': 'Улучшение модели китайского языка с помощью гетерогенного лингвистического графа', 'ga': 'Samhail Teanga Réamh-oilte na Síne a Fheabhsú trí Ghraf Teangeolaíochta Ilchineálach', 'hu': 'A kínai előképzett nyelvi modell fejlesztése heterogén nyelvészeti grafikon keresztül', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση του κινεζικού προ-εκπαιδευμένου γλωσσικού μοντέλου μέσω του ετερογενούς γλωσσικού γραφήματος', 'it': 'Migliorare il modello linguistico pre-addestrato cinese tramite il grafico linguistico eterogeno', 'lt': 'Kinijos išankstinio mokymo kalbos modelio gerinimas naudojant heterogeninę kalbos grafiką', 'ms': 'Meningkatkan Model Bahasa Terlatih China melalui Graf Bahasa Heterogen', 'mk': 'Зголемување на кинескиот предобучен јазик модел преку хетерогенски јазички граф', 'mt': 'It-titjib tal-Mudell tal-Lingwistika Ċiniża mħarreġ minn qabel permezz tal-Grafika tal-Lingwistika Eteroġenea', 'ml': 'Name', 'mn': 'Хятадын өмнөх сургалтын хэл загварыг Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph-ээр нэмэгдүүлэх', 'no': 'Forstørrar kinesisk før- treng språk- modell via Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Қытай алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгісін Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph арқылы көтеру', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea modelului limbii chineze pre-instruite prin intermediul graficului lingvistic heterogen', 'pl': 'Wzmocnienie chińskiego modelu językowego przeszkolonego poprzez wykres językowy heterogenny', 'sr': 'Povećavanje kineskog predobučenog jezičkog modela kroz Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Horumarinta qaababka afka hore ee Shiino ku tababaray', 'sv': 'Förbättra kinesisk färdigutbildad språkmodell via heterogen lingvistisk graf', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường ngôn ngữ học của Trung Quốc thông qua đồ họa ngôn ngữ dị giáo', 'hr': 'Povećavanje kineskog predobučenog jezičkog modela kroz Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph', 'da': 'Forbedring af kinesisk præuddannet sprogmodel via heterogen lingvistisk graf', 'nl': 'Verbetering van Chinees Vooropgeleid Taalmodel via Heterogene Taalgrafiek', 'bg': 'Подобряване на китайския предварително обучен езиков модел чрез хетерогенна лингвистика Графика', 'de': 'Verbesserung des chinesischen vortrainierten Sprachmodells durch heterogene Linguistik Graph', 'ko': '이질언어학도를 이용하여 중국어 예훈련 언어 모델을 강화하다', 'id': 'Meningkatkan Model Bahasa Terlatih Cina melalui Graf Bahasa Heterogen', 'fa': 'افزایش مدل زبان پیش آموزش چینی از طریق گراف زبان هترogeneous Linguistics', 'sw': 'Kuwezesha Utawala wa Lugha ya Kichina wa Taifa lililofundishwa mbele kupitia Graph ya Kilinguistics ya Heterogeneous', 'tr': 'Heterogen Dili Grafik bilen Çinçe öňünden eğlenen Diller', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i modelit kinez të gjuhës së trajnuar paraprakisht nëpërmjet grafikut të gjuhës heterogjene', 'hy': 'Հետրոգեն լեզվաբանության գրաֆիկի միջոցով բարելավել չինական նախապատրաստված լեզվաբանական մոդելը', 'af': 'Verbeter Sjinese vooraf- opgelei taal Model deur Heterogeneous Linguistics Grafik', 'az': '칂inc톛 칐n-t톛hsil Dil Modelini Heterogeneous Linguistics Grafi vasit톛sil톛 art캼rmaq', 'bn': 'Name', 'am': 'የቻይንኛ ቀዳሚ ቋንቋ ሞዴል', 'ca': 'millorar el model de llenguatge xinès pré-entrenat a través del gràfic de lingüística heterogène', 'bs': 'Povećavanje kineskog predobučenog jezičkog modela kroz Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph', 'cs': 'Zlepšení čínského předškoleného jazykového modelu prostřednictvím heterogenního lingvistického grafu', 'et': 'Hiina keele mudeli parandamine heterogeense keeleteaduse graafika kaudu', 'fi': 'Kiinan esikoulutetun kielimallin parantaminen heterogeenisen kielitieteen avulla', 'jv': 'Ngubah Jewaning Panjenengan Rasang Panjenengan Terus', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'שיפור מודל שפת סיני מאומן מראש באמצעות גרף שפת טרוגינית', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje kitajskega vnaprej usposobljenega jezikovnega modela s heterogeno jezikoslovje Graf', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་གི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་ཚད་ལྟར་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་།'}
{'en': 'We study the problem of building text classifiers with little or no training data, commonly known as zero and few-shot text classification. In recent years, an approach based on neural textual entailment models has been found to give strong results on a diverse range of tasks. In this work, we show that with proper pre-training, Siamese Networks that embed texts and labels offer a competitive alternative. These models allow for a large reduction in inference cost: constant in the number of labels rather than linear. Furthermore, we introduce label tuning, a simple and computationally efficient approach that allows to adapt the models in a few-shot setup by only changing the label embeddings. While giving lower performance than model fine-tuning, this approach has the architectural advantage that a single encoder can be shared by many different tasks.', 'es': 'Los modelos lingüísticos chinos previamente entrenados normalmente aprovechan la información contextual de los caracteres para aprender representaciones, mientras ignoran los conocimientos lingüísticos, por ejemplo, la información de palabras y oraciones. Por lo tanto, proponemos un módulo de mejora sin tareas denominado Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) para mejorar los modelos lingüísticos preentrenados en chino mediante la integración del conocimiento lingüístico. Específicamente, construimos un gráfico heterogéneo jerárquico para modelar las características de la estructura lingüística del idioma chino, y realizamos un método basado en gráficos para resumir y concretar información sobre diferentes granularidades de las jerarquías lingüísticas chinas.\nLos resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro modelo tiene la capacidad de mejorar el rendimiento de BERT, BERTWWM y ERNIE 1.0 en 6 tareas de procesamiento de lenguaje natural con 10 conjuntos de datos de referencia. Además, los análisis experimentales detallados han demostrado que este tipo de modelización logra más mejoras en comparación con los sólidos MWA de referencia anteriores. Mientras tanto, nuestro modelo introduce muchos menos parámetros (aproximadamente la mitad de la MWA) y la velocidad de entrenamiento/inferencia es aproximadamente 7 veces más rápida que la MWA.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تستغل نماذج اللغة الصينية المدربة مسبقًا معلومات الشخصية السياقية لتعلم التمثيلات ، مع تجاهل المعرفة اللغوية ، على سبيل المثال ، معلومات الكلمات والجمل. ومن ثم ، فإننا نقترح وحدة تحسين خالية من المهام تسمى الرسم البياني اللغوي غير المتجانسة (HLG) لتعزيز نماذج اللغة الصينية المدربة مسبقًا من خلال دمج المعرفة اللغوية. على وجه التحديد ، نحن نبني رسمًا بيانيًا هرميًا غير متجانس لنمذجة هيكل الخصائص اللغوية للغة الصينية ، وإجراء طريقة قائمة على الرسم البياني لتلخيص وتجميع المعلومات حول التفاصيل المختلفة للتسلسل الهرمي لعلم اللغة الصينية.\nتوضح النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا لديه القدرة على تحسين أداء Vanilla BERT و BERTwwm و ERNIE 1.0 في 6 مهام لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية مع 10 مجموعات بيانات معيارية. علاوة على ذلك ، أثبتت التحليلات التجريبية التفصيلية أن هذا النوع من النمذجة يحقق المزيد من التحسينات مقارنة بخط الأساس القوي السابق MWA. وفي الوقت نفسه ، يقدم نموذجنا معلمات أقل بكثير (حوالي نصف MWA) وسرعة التدريب / الاستدلال أسرع بحوالي 7 مرات من MWA.', 'pt': 'Modelos de linguagem pré-treinados chineses geralmente exploram informações de caracteres contextuais para aprender representações, ignorando o conhecimento linguístico, por exemplo, informações de palavras e frases. Assim, propomos um módulo de aprimoramento sem tarefas denominado como Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) para aprimorar os modelos de linguagem pré-treinados chineses, integrando o conhecimento linguístico. Especificamente, construímos um grafo hierárquico heterogêneo para modelar as características da estrutura linguística da língua chinesa e conduzimos um método baseado em grafos para resumir e concretizar informações sobre diferentes granularidades das hierarquias linguísticas chinesas.\nOs resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso modelo tem a capacidade de melhorar o desempenho do vanilla BERT, BERTwwm e ERNIE 1.0 em 6 tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural com 10 conjuntos de dados de referência. Além disso, as análises experimentais detalhadas provaram que esse tipo de modelagem alcança mais melhorias em comparação com o forte MWA de linha de base anterior. Enquanto isso, nosso modelo introduz muito menos parâmetros (cerca de metade do MWA) e a velocidade de treinamento/inferência é cerca de 7x mais rápida que o MWA.', 'fr': "Les modèles linguistiques chinois pré-entraînés exploitent généralement les informations contextuelles des caractères pour apprendre des représentations, tout en ignorant les connaissances linguistiques, par exemple les informations sur les mots et les phrases. Par conséquent, nous proposons un module d'amélioration sans tâche appelé HLG (Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph) pour améliorer les modèles de langue chinoise pré-entraînés en intégrant les connaissances linguistiques. Plus précisément, nous construisons un graphe hétérogène hiérarchique pour modéliser la structure linguistique caractéristique de la langue chinoise, et nous menons une méthode basée sur des graphes pour résumer et concrétiser les informations sur les différentes granularités des hiérarchies linguistiques chinoises.\nLes résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre modèle a la capacité d'améliorer les performances de BERT, BertWM et ERNIE 1.0 sur 6 tâches de traitement du langage naturel avec 10 ensembles de données de référence. De plus, les analyses expérimentales détaillées ont prouvé que ce type de modélisation permet d'obtenir plus d'améliorations par rapport à la MWA de base forte précédente. Pendant ce temps, notre modèle introduit beaucoup moins de paramètres (environ la moitié de la MWA) et la vitesse d'entraînement/d'inférence est environ 7 fois plus rapide que la MWA.", 'ja': '中国の事前に訓練された言語モデルは、通常、単語や文章情報などの言語学的知識を無視しながら、表現を学習するために文脈上の文字情報を利用する。 そこで、言語学の知識を統合することで中国語の事前訓練された言語モデルを強化するための、異種言語学グラフ（ HLG ）と呼ばれるタスクフリーの強化モジュールを提案する。 具体的には、中国語の言語構造の特徴をモデル化するための階層的異種グラフを構築し、中国語の言語階層のさまざまな粒度に関する情報をまとめて具体化するためのグラフベースの方法を実施する。\n実験結果は、当社のモデルが、10のベンチマークデータセットを備えた6つの自然言語処理タスクにおけるバニラBERT、BERTwwm、およびERNIE 1.0のパフォーマンスを向上させる能力を持っていることを示しています。 さらに、詳細な実験分析は、この種のモデリングが、以前の強力なベースラインMWAと比較して、より多くの改善を達成することを証明している。 一方、当社のモデルは、パラメータをはるかに少なく（ MWAの約半分）導入し、訓練/推論速度はMWAよりも約7倍速い。', 'zh': '汉语预训语言模常以上下文字符息学习表征,而略语言学知识,如单词句信息。 是以异构语言学图(HLG)之无任务模块,整合语言学知以强汉语。 构一层异构图以拟语语言学,而以图言语言学层次结构粒度结具体化。\n实验结果表明,吾道能崇vanilla BERT、BERTwwm、ERNIE 1.0于6自然语言,而有10数集焉。 此外详实验析证,比之前强基线MWA,其建模益多。 同时模引参数要少多(盖MWA半),训练/倍于MWA7。', 'hi': 'चीनी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल आमतौर पर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए प्रासंगिक चरित्र जानकारी का शोषण करते हैं, जबकि भाषाविज्ञान ज्ञान की अनदेखी करते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, शब्द और वाक्य जानकारी। इसलिए, हम भाषाविज्ञान ज्ञान को एकीकृत करके चीनी पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को बढ़ाने के लिए विषम भाषा विज्ञान ग्राफ (एचएलजी) नामक एक कार्य-मुक्त वृद्धि मॉड्यूल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम चीनी भाषा की विशेषताओं भाषाविज्ञान संरचना को मॉडल करने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित विषम ग्राफ का निर्माण करते हैं, और चीनी भाषाविज्ञान पदानुक्रमों की विभिन्न ग्रैन्युलैरिटीज पर जानकारी को संक्षेप में और संकुचित करने के लिए एक ग्राफ-आधारित विधि का संचालन करते हैं।\nप्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे मॉडल में 10 बेंचमार्क डेटासेट के साथ 6 प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों पर वेनिला BERT, BERTwwm और ERNIE 1.0 के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने की क्षमता है। इसके अलावा, विस्तृत प्रयोगात्मक विश्लेषणों ने साबित कर दिया है कि इस तरह के मॉडलीकरण ने पिछले मजबूत बेसलाइन एमडब्ल्यूए की तुलना में अधिक सुधार प्राप्त किए हैं। इस बीच, हमारा मॉडल बहुत कम मापदंडों (एमडब्ल्यूए का लगभग आधा) का परिचय देता है और प्रशिक्षण / अनुमान की गति एमडब्ल्यूए की तुलना में लगभग 7x तेज है।', 'ru': 'Китайские заранее обученные языковые модели обычно используют контекстуальную информацию о персонажах для изучения представлений, игнорируя при этом знания лингвистики, например, информацию о словах и предложениях. Следовательно, мы предлагаем беззадачный модуль улучшения, называемый гетерогенным лингвистическим графом (HLG), для улучшения предварительно обученных языковых моделей Китая путем интеграции лингвистических знаний. В частности, мы строим иерархический гетерогенный граф для моделирования характеристик лингвистической структуры китайского языка и проводим метод на основе графа для обобщения и конкретизации информации о различных деталях иерархий китайской лингвистики.\nЭкспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель способна улучшить производительность Vanilla BERT, BERTWWM и ERNIE 1.0 по 6 задачам обработки естественного языка с 10 эталонными наборами данных. Кроме того, подробные экспериментальные анализы доказали, что этот вид моделирования достигает большего улучшения по сравнению с предыдущей мощной базовой MWA. Между тем, наша модель вводит гораздо меньше параметров (около половины MWA), а скорость обучения/вывода примерно в 7 раз быстрее, чем MWA.', 'ga': 'Is iondúil go n-úsáideann samhlacha teanga réamhoilte na Síne faisnéis faoi charachtair comhthéacsúla chun léiriúcháin a fhoghlaim, agus neamhaird á tabhairt ar eolas na teangeolaíochta, m.sh. faisnéis focal agus abairtí. Mar sin, molaimid modúl feabhsaithe saor ó thasc ar a dtugtar Graf Teangeolaíochta Ilchineálach (HLG) chun samhlacha teanga réamhoilte na Síne a fheabhsú trí eolas ar theangeolaíocht a chomhtháthú. Go sonrach, déanaimid graf ilchineálach ordlathach a thógáil chun saintréithe struchtúr teangeolaíochta na Síne a shamhaltú, agus déanaimid modh bunaithe ar ghraif chun faisnéis a achoimriú agus a choincréitiú ar mhéideanna éagsúla ordlathais teangeolaíochta na Síne.\nLéiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil an cumas ag ár múnla feidhmíocht BERT, BERTwwm agus ERNIE 1.0 fanaile a fheabhsú ar 6 thasc próiseála teanga nádúrtha le 10 dtacar sonraí tagarmharcála. Ina theannta sin, tá sé cruthaithe ag na hanailísí turgnamhacha mionsonraithe go mbaineann an cineál seo de shamhaltú níos mó feabhsuithe amach i gcomparáid le MWA bonnlíne láidir roimhe seo. Idir an dá linn, tugann ár múnla isteach i bhfad níos lú paraiméadair (thart ar leath de MWA) agus tá an luas oiliúna / tátal thart ar 7x níos tapúla ná MWA.', 'hu': 'A kínai, előre képzett nyelvi modellek általában a kontextuális karakterinformációkat használják fel a reprezentációk megtanulására, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyják a nyelvészeti ismereteket, például a szó- és mondatinformációkat. Ezért egy feladatmentes fejlesztő modult javasolunk, amelyet Heterogén Nyelvészeti Graph (HLG) néven neveznek, hogy a nyelvészeti ismeretek integrálásával javítsa a kínai előképzett nyelvi modelleket. Konkrétan egy hierarchikus heterogén gráfot építünk fel a kínai nyelv jellemzőinek nyelvészeti struktúrájának modellezésére, valamint egy gráf alapú módszert végezünk a kínai nyelvészeti hierarchiák különböző granularitásairól és konkrétítására.', 'ka': 'ჩინეთი წინ განაკეთებული ენების მოდელები უბრალოდ კონტექსტური ინფორმაციას გამოიყენებენ, რომლებიც განაკეთებული ინფორმაციების შესაძლებელად, მაგრამ ინფორმაციას ინგორმა ამიტომ, ჩვენ მინდომებით ჩინტერეგენო ლინგურისტიკის გრაფი (HLG) სახელსაწყობინება ჩინეთი წინასწარმოვიდგინეთ ენის მოდელების უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ იერაქტიკური ჰეტეროგენი გრაფის შექმნა, რომ ჩინეთი ენერაქტიკური სტრუქტურის პერაქტიკების მოდელეციები მოდულიზებთ, და გავაკეთებთ გრაფიკური მეტი, რომ ჩინეთი ენერაქტიკური hi', 'el': 'Τα κινεζικά προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα χρησιμοποιούν συνήθως τις πληροφορίες χαρακτήρων του περιβάλλοντος για να μάθουν αναπαραστάσεις, ενώ αγνοούν τις γλωσσικές γνώσεις, π.χ. πληροφορίες λέξεων και προτάσεων. Ως εκ τούτου, προτείνουμε μια ενότητα βελτίωσης χωρίς εργασία που ονομάζεται ετερογενή γλωσσικό γράφημα (για την ενίσχυση των κινεζικών προ-εκπαιδευμένων γλωσσικών μοντέλων ενσωματώνοντας γλωσσικές γνώσεις. Συγκεκριμένα, κατασκευάζουμε ένα ιεραρχικό ετερογενή γράφημα για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τα χαρακτηριστικά της γλωσσικής δομής της κινεζικής γλώσσας, και εφαρμόζουμε μια μέθοδο βασισμένη σε γραφήματα για να συνοψίσουμε και να συγκεκριμενοποιήσουμε πληροφορίες σχετικά με τις διαφορετικές κοκκοποιητικές ιεραρχίες της κινεζικής γλωσσολογίας.', 'it': 'I modelli linguistici pre-addestrati cinesi di solito sfruttano le informazioni dei caratteri contestuali per imparare le rappresentazioni, ignorando le conoscenze linguistiche, ad esempio le informazioni di parole e frasi. Pertanto, proponiamo un modulo di miglioramento senza compiti chiamato Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) per migliorare i modelli linguistici pre-formati cinesi integrando le conoscenze linguistiche. Nello specifico, costruiamo un grafico gerarchico eterogeneo per modellare le caratteristiche della struttura linguistica della lingua cinese e conduciamo un metodo basato su grafico per riassumere e concretizzare le informazioni sulle diverse granularità delle gerarchie linguistiche cinesi.', 'mk': 'Кинеските предобучени јазички модели обично искористуваат контекстни информации за карактеристички карактери за да научат претставувања, иако го игнорираат јазичното знаење, на пример информации за зборови и реченици. Затоа, предложуваме модул за подобрување без задачи наречен Хетерогенски лингвистички граф (ХЛГ) за подобрување на кинеските предобучени јазички модели со интеграција на јазичкото знаење. Специфично, конструираме хиерархичен хетероген граф за да ги моделираме карактеристиките на јазичната структура на кинескиот јазик и да спроведеме метод базиран на граф за резимирање и конкретизација на информациите за различните грануларности на кинеските јазични хиерар', 'kk': 'Қытай алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілері кәдімгі мәліметтерді оқыту үшін контексті таңбалар мәліметін жұмыс істейді, лингвистикалық мәліметтерді елемейді, мысалы, сөз мен сө Сондықтан, біз тілім мәліметін біріктіру арқылы қытапша алдын- оқылған тіл үлгілерін көтеру үшін Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) деп аталатын тапсырманыз бос жақсарту модулін ұсындық. Ескерілікті, біз хитайлық тілдің лингвистикалық құрылымын үлгілеу үшін иерархиялық гетероген график құрып, график негіздеген тәсілі қытайлық лингвистикалық иерархиялардың түрлі грануляриялық мәліметін жазып, түсін', 'lt': 'Kinijos išankstinio mokymo kalbų modeliai paprastai naudoja kontekstinę informaciją, kad galėtų mokytis atstovavimų, ignoruodami kalbų žinias, pvz., žodžių ir sakinių informaciją. Todėl siūlome nemokėtą tobulinimo modulį, vadinamą Heterogeninės kalbos grafiku (HLG), kad būtų tobulinami Kinijos išankstinio mokymo kalbos modeliai, integruojant kalbos žinias. Konkrečiai sukuriame hierarchinį heterogeninį grafiką, kad modeliuotume Kinijos kalbos kalbos struktūrą ir atliktume grafiniu būdu pagrįstą metodą, kuriuo apibendrinama ir konkretizuojama informacija apie skirtingus Kinijos kalbos hierarchijų granuliarumus.', 'ms': 'Model bahasa pra-dilatih Cina biasanya mengeksploitasi maklumat aksara kontekstual untuk belajar perwakilan, sementara mengabaikan pengetahuan bahasa, cth., maklumat perkataan dan kalimat. Oleh itu, kami cadangkan modul peningkatan bebas tugas yang disebut Graf Bahasa Heterogen (HLG) untuk meningkatkan model bahasa China yang dilatih-dilatih dengan mengintegrasikan pengetahuan bahasa. Secara khusus, kita membina graf heterogeni hierarkik untuk model struktur bahasa karakteristik bahasa bahasa Cina, dan melakukan kaedah berdasarkan graf untuk mengurangkan dan mengkretikan maklumat tentang granulariti berbeza dalam hierarki bahasa Cina.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli lingwistiċi Ċiniżi mħarrġa minn qabel ġeneralment jisfruttaw informazzjoni dwar il-karattru kuntestwali biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet, filwaqt li jinjoraw l-g ħarfien lingwistiku, pereżempju informazzjoni dwar il-kliem u s-sentenza. Għalhekk, qed nipproponu modulu ta’ titjib mingħajr kompiti msejjaħ Grafika tal-Lingwistika Eteroġenea (HLG) biex jissaħħu l-mudelli tal-lingwi Ċiniżi mħarrġa minn qabel billi jintegraw l-għarfien lingwistiku. Speċifikament, a ħna nibnu graff ġerarkiku eteroġenu biex nimmudellaw l-istruttura lingwistika tal-karatteristiċi tal-lingwa Ċiniża, u nagħmlu metodu bbażat fuq graff biex niġbru fil-qosor u nikkonkretizzaw l-informazzjoni dwar granularitajiet differenti tal-ġerarkiji lingwistiċi Ċiniżi.', 'mn': 'Хятад сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загварууд ихэвчлэн хэлний мэдлэг, жишээ нь үг болон өгүүлбэр мэдээллийг мэдэхэд орчин үеийн харилцааны мэдээллийг ашигладаг. Иймээс бид Хятад хэлний мэдлэгийг нэгтгэхэд хичнээн сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлэх боломжтой ажлын үнэгүй нэмэгдүүлэх модуль санал өгдөг. Ялангуяа бид Хятад хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлбэрийг загварчлахын тулд хичээлийн гетерогены график бүтээж, график суурилсан аргыг Хятад хэлний хэлний төлбөрийн өөр гранулалын тухай мэдээллийг цуглуулах, тодорхойлох боломжтой аргыг хийдэг', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. ഭാ അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഹെറോറജെന്നിയുള്ള ലിങ്ഗിസ്റ്റിക്സ് ഗ്രാഫ് എന്ന പേരുള്ള ഒരു ജോലി സ്വതന്ത്ര്യ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഘടകം പ്രോഗ്രാപ്തികമാക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ചൈനീസ് ഭാഷയുടെ സ്കാര്യത്തികവിദ്യഭാഷയുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുവാനും ചൈനീസ് ഭാഷയുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ വിവരങ', 'no': 'Kinesiske først trengte språk- modeller brukar vanlegvis kontekst- teiknformasjon for å lære representasjonar, mens du ignorerer språk- kunnskap, f. eks. ord og setningsinformasjon. I tillegg foreslår vi ein modul for forbetringa frå oppgåver som Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) for å forbetra kinesiske før-trente språk-modeller ved å integrere språk-kunnskap. Spesielt konstruerer vi eit hierarkisk heterogenesk graf for å modellere karakteristiske lingviske strukturen av kinesisk språk, og gjere eit grafobasert metode for å sammenligne og konkretera informasjon om ulike granulariser av kinesiske lingviske hierarki.', 'sr': 'Kineski predobučeni jezički modeli obično iskorištavaju kontekstualne informacije o karakterima kako bi naučili zastupanje, dok ignoriraju jezičke znanje, npr. informacije o reči i rečenici. Stoga predlažemo modul poboljšanja bez zadataka nazvan Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) da poboljša kineske pre-obučene jezičke modele integracijom jezičkih znanja. Posebno, izgradimo hijerarhički heterogeneski grafik kako bi modelili karakteristiku lingvističke strukture kineskog jezika, i provodili na grafiku baziranu metodu da sažete i konkretiramo informacije o različitim granularitima kineskih hijerarhija jezika.', 'ro': 'Modelele lingvistice pre-instruite din China exploatează, de obicei, informațiile contextuale despre caractere pentru a învăța reprezentări, ignorând în același timp cunoștințele lingvistice, de exemplu informațiile cuvintelor și propozițiilor. Prin urmare, propunem un modul de îmbunătățire fără sarcini denumit grafic lingvistic heterogen (HLG) pentru a îmbunătăți modelele lingvistice pre-instruite chineză prin integrarea cunoștințelor lingvistice. În mod specific, construim un grafic ierarhic heterogen pentru a modela structura lingvistică a caracteristicilor limbii chineze și efectuăm o metodă bazată pe grafice pentru a rezuma și concretiza informații despre diferite granularități ale ierarhiilor lingvistice chineze.', 'si': 'චීනි ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂාව මොඩේල් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරධානය තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ඉතින්, අපි කාර්ය නිදහස් විශේෂ මොඩියුල් කියලා හෙට්\u200dරෝගෙනියෝස් ලින්ග්විස්ටික් ග්\u200dරාෆ් (HLG) කියලා චීනියානු ප්\u200dරධාන භා විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි චීනි භාෂාවේ භාෂාවික සංස්ථානයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා සහ චීනි භාෂාවික සංස්ථානයක් සම්පූර්ණය සහ සම්පූර්ණය සඳ', 'so': 'Tusaalada afka Shiinooyinka e e hore lagu tababaray sida caadiga ah waxay u isticmaalaan macluumaad ku saabsan aqoonta aqoonta afka, tusaale ahaan hadalka iyo hadalka. Sidaa darteed waxaan horumarinaynaa qalabka horumarinta shaqo-aan-lacag la’aanta ah oo lagu magacaabaa qoraalka luqada ee Heterogeneous Linguistics (HLG) si aan u kordhino qaababka afka hore ee Shiino ku tababaray si uu u qabsado aqoonta luuqada luuqada. Si gaar ah, waxaynu dhisnaa xariijiyo hierarchical heterogeneous, si aan u sameyno dhismaha afka Shiino, waxaana sameynaa qaab ku saabsan karta oo ku saabsan macluumaad ku saabsan xariijimo kala duduwan oo luuqadaha Shiino ku qoran.', 'sv': 'Kinesiska förklädda språkmodeller utnyttjar vanligtvis kontextuell teckeninformation för att lära sig representationer, samtidigt som man ignorerar språkkunskapen, t.ex. ord- och meningsinformation. Därför föreslår vi en uppgiftsfri förbättringsmodul kallad Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) för att förbättra kinesiska förklädda språkmodeller genom att integrera språkkunskaper. Specifikt konstruerar vi en hierarkisk heterogen graf för att modellera egenskaperna för lingvistik struktur i kinesiska språket, och genomför en grafbaserad metod för att sammanfatta och konkretisera information om olika granulariteter i kinesiska lingvistik hierarkier.', 'pl': 'Chińskie wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe zwykle wykorzystują kontekstowe informacje o znakach do nauki reprezentacji, ignorując jednocześnie wiedzę językową, np. informacje o słowach i zdaniach. W związku z tym proponujemy bezzadaniowy moduł ulepszania zwany Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) w celu ulepszenia chińskich wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych poprzez integrację wiedzy językowej. W szczególności, konstruujemy hierarchiczny heterogeniczny wykres, aby modelować charakterystykę językową struktury języka chińskiego i przeprowadzamy metodę opartą na wykresie do podsumowania i konkretyzowania informacji na temat różnych granularności hierarchii językowej chińskiej.', 'ta': 'முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகள் வழக்கமாக குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல்களை கற்றுக் கொள்வது போல் சீனம் பயன்படுத்துகிறது, மொழி அதனால், நாங்கள் ஹெட்டரோஜென்ஜியான Linguistics Graph (HLG) என்று அழைக்கப்பட்ட பணி இலவச மேம்பாட்டு கூற்றை முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு மூலம்  குறிப்பிட்டு, சீன மொழியின் தனிப்பட்ட மொழி வடிவமைப்பை மாதிரிக்க ஒரு ஹையர்சிக் ஹெட்ரோஜன் வரைபடத்தை நாம் உருவாக்கி, மற்றும் ஒரு வரைபடத்தின் முறையை சுருக்கவும் மற்றும்', 'ur': 'چین کی پیش آموزش کی زبان کی مدلکوں معمولاً معلوم ہوتے ہیں کہ معلومات کی تعلیم سکھانے کے لئے کنٹکسٹیول شخصیت کی معلومات کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، اور زبان علم کو نادانی کرتے ہیں، جیسے کلام اور جماعت معلومات. اسی وجہ سے ہم نے ایک ایسے کام-free enhancement موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جس کا نام Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) ہے کہ زبان شناسی علم کے ساتھ چین کی پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کو بڑھائے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم نے چینی زبان کی زبان کی خصوصیات کی بنائی ہے اور ایک گراف کی بنیادی طریقہ کی بنائی ہے کہ چینی زبان کی مختلف گرانولریتیوں کے بارے میں معلومات کو جمع کرے اور مشترک کرے۔', 'uz': "Chinese pre-trained language models usually exploit contextual character information to learn representations, while ignoring the linguistics knowledge, e.g., word and sentence information.  Shunday qilib, biz o'zining lingvistik grafik (HLG) deb nomlangan vazifa bilan o'zgartirish modulini tasavvur qilamiz, o'sha tilni o'rganishdan oldin o'rganish uchun Xitoycha modellarini oshirish uchun. Ko'rsatilgan, biz Xitoycha tillarining xususiyatlari tuzilishi uchun hierarchik heterogen grafikni yaratib, va Xitoycha tillarining boshqa grafik hierarchiyatlarining haqida maʼlumotni qisqarish va bogʻlash uchun grafik asosida bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Cơ chế ngôn ngữ được huấn luyện Trung Quốc thường tận dụng thông tin nhân dạng ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ ngữ để học các biểu tượng, mặc dù không biết về ngôn ngữ, ví dụ. Do đó, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô- đun tăng cường miễn nhiệm vụ được gọi là đồ họa ngôn ngữ học dị giáo (ALG) để nâng cao các mô hình ngôn ngữ Trung Quốc bằng cách nhập vào kiến thức ngôn ngữ. Cụ thể, chúng tôi xây dựng một đồ thị khác giới sẽ mô tả các đặc trưng cấu trúc ngôn ngữ của ngôn ngữ Trung Quốc, và thực hiện một phương pháp dựa trên đồ thị để tổng hợp và kết hợp thông tin về các phân loại khác nhau của các phân loại ngôn ngữ Trung Quốc.', 'bg': 'Китайските предварително обучени езикови модели обикновено използват контекстуалната информация за характера, за да научат представяне, като същевременно игнорират езиковото знание, например информация за думи и изречения. Ето защо предлагаме модул за усъвършенстване без задачи, наречен Хетерогенна лингвистична графика (ХРГ), за подобряване на китайските предварително обучени езикови модели чрез интегриране на лингвистичните знания. По-конкретно, ние конструираме йерархична хетерогенна графика за моделиране на характеристиките лингвистична структура на китайския език и провеждаме графичен метод за обобщаване и конкретизиране на информацията за различните подробности на китайските лингвистични йерархии.', 'da': 'Kinesiske præuddannede sprogmodeller udnytter normalt kontekstuelle tegnformationer til at lære repræsentationer, mens man ignorerer lingvistisk viden, f.eks. ord- og sætningsinformation. Derfor foreslår vi et opgavefrit forbedringsmodul kaldet Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) for at forbedre kinesiske præuddannede sprogmodeller ved at integrere lingvistisk viden. Specielt konstruerer vi en hierarkisk heterogen graf til at modellere karakteristika lingvistisk struktur i kinesisk sprog, og gennemfører en grafbaseret metode til at opsummere og konkretisere oplysninger om forskellige granulariteter i kinesisk lingvistisk hierarkier.', 'nl': 'Chinese voorgetrainde taalmodellen gebruiken meestal contextuele karakterinformatie om representaties te leren, terwijl ze de taalkundige kennis negeren, bijvoorbeeld woord- en zinsinformatie. Daarom stellen we een taakvrije verbeteringsmodule voor die heterogene linguïstische grafiek (HLG) wordt genoemd om Chinese voorgetrainde taalmodellen te verbeteren door taalkundige kennis te integreren. Specifiek, bouwen we een hiërarchische heterogene grafiek om de kenmerken linguïstische structuur van de Chinese taal te modelleren, en voeren we een grafiekgebaseerde methode uit om informatie over verschillende granulariteiten van Chinese linguïstische hiërarchieën samen te vatten en te concretiseren.', 'de': 'Chinesische vortrainierte Sprachmodelle nutzen in der Regel kontextbezogene Zeicheninformationen, um Repräsentationen zu lernen, während linguistische Kenntnisse, z.B. Wort- und Satzininformationen, ignoriert werden. Daher schlagen wir ein aufgabenfreies Erweiterungsmodul namens Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) vor, um chinesische vortrainierte Sprachmodelle durch Integration linguistischer Kenntnisse zu verbessern. Insbesondere konstruieren wir einen hierarchischen heterogenen Graphen, um die linguistische Struktur der chinesischen Sprache zu modellieren, und führen eine graphenbasierte Methode durch, um Informationen über verschiedene Granularitäten chinesischer Linguistik-Hierarchien zusammenzufassen und zu konkretisieren.', 'id': 'Model bahasa China yang sudah dilatih biasanya mengeksploitasi informasi karakter kontekstual untuk belajar representation, sementara mengabaikan pengetahuan bahasa, misalnya informasi kata dan kalimat. Oleh karena itu, kami mengusulkan modul pengembangan tanpa tugas yang disebut Graf Linguistik Heterogen (HLG) untuk meningkatkan model bahasa China yang terlatih sebelumnya dengan mengintegrasi pengetahuan bahasa. Secara spesifik, kami membangun grafik heterogenus hierarkis untuk model karakteristik struktur lingwistik bahasa Cina, dan melakukan metode berdasarkan grafik untuk merasumkan dan mengkretisasi informasi tentang granularitas berbeda dari hierarki bahasa Cina.', 'fa': 'مدلهای زبان پیش آموزش چینی معمولاً اطلاعات شخصیت متوسط را برای یاد گرفتن نمایش\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند، در حالی که علم زبان\u200cشناسی، مثال اطلاعات کلمه و جمله را نادیده می\u200cگیرد. بنابراین، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مولد افزایش آزاد کار به عنوان Graph Heterogeneous Linguistics (HLG) برای افزایش مدلهای زبان پیش آموزش چینی با توجه به دانش زبان\u200cشناسی. مخصوصاً ما یک گراف تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر معنی را برای مدل ساختن ویژگی زبان چینی ساختیم، و یک روش بنیاد گراف را برای جمع کردن و مشخص کردن اطلاعات درباره گرانولاری های مختلف زبان چینی انجام می دهیم.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa lugha za Kichina ulioendelea mara nyingi hutumia taarifa za wahusika wa kawaida ili kujifunza uwakilishi, wakati wakipuuza maarifa ya lugha, mfano maneno na taarifa za hukumu. Kwa hiyo, tunapendekeza kituo cha kuongeza bure cha kazi kinachoitwa kama Graph ya Kilinguistics (HLG) ya Heterogeneous (HLG) kuongeza mifano ya lugha zilizofundishwa kabla ya China kwa kuunganisha maarifa ya lugha. Kwa ujumla, tunajenga picha yenye asili ya kijeshi ili kuonyesha muundo wa utaalamu wa lugha za Kichina, na kutengeneza njia inayotegemea kwenye picha ili kuharibu na kuhamasisha taarifa zinazohusu vipengele tofauti vya lugha za Kichina.', 'tr': '횜흫 bilim sistemasy 횉in챌e 철흫den 철흫den bilim nusgalaryny adat챌a metin karakterleri흫 habaryny 철wrenmek 체챌in ullan첵ar, mesel창, s철zler we s철zler maglumatyny 첵ok ed첵채r. 힇ol seb채pli biz Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) di첵ilip atlandyran 횉in챌e 철흫체nden 철흫체nden 철흫체nden 철흫체nden 철흫체nden 철흫체nden e휓lenen dil modellerini geli힊tirmek 체챌in t채ze bir t채ze ta첵첵arlanmagy teklip ed첵채ris. Adat챌a, biz 횉in챌e dilini흫 lingwistiki guramlaryny 철rneklemek 체챌in bir i첵erarhi첵a heterogenen grafiki in힊a ed첵채ris we 횉in챌e lingwistiki i첵erarhi첵asyny흫 farkl캇 granularitleri barada g철rkezmek we 챌철z체mle힊mek 체챌in grafiki tabanly y철ntemi 챌ykar첵arys.', 'af': "Sjinese voorafoerende taal modele gebruik gewoonlik contextual karakterinligting om te leer voorstellings, terwyl die lingwisiese kennis ignoreer, bv. woord en sê inligting. Daarom, ons voorstel 'n taak-vry verbetering module wat as Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) genoem word om Sjinese voorafoerende taal modele te verbeter deur linguistiese kennis te integreer. Spesifieke, ons konstrukteer 'n hierarkies heterogeneese graf om die karakteristieke lingwisiese struktuur van Sjinese taal te model en 'n graafgebaseerde metode te doen om inligting op verskillende granularisies van Sjinese lingwisiese hierarkies te opsommer en te sameleer.", 'hr': 'Kineski predobučeni jezički modeli obično iskorištavaju kontekstualne informacije o karakterima kako bi naučili zastupanje, dok ignoriraju jezičke znanje, npr. informacije o riječi i rečenici. Stoga predlažemo modul poboljšanja bez zadataka nazvan Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) kako bi poboljšali kineske predobučene jezičke modele integracijom jezičkih znanja. Posebno, mi konstruiramo hijerarhički heterogeneski grafik kako bi modelili karakteristike lingvističke strukture kineskog jezika, i provodili metodu temeljenu na grafiku kako bi sažetili i konkretirali informacije o različitim granularitima kineskih hijerarhija jezika.', 'sq': 'Modelet kineze të paratrajnuara gjuhësh zakonisht shfrytëzojnë informacionin e karakterit kontekstual për të mësuar përfaqësime, duke injoruar njohuritë gjuhësore, për shembull informacionin e fjalëve dhe fjalëve. Kështu, ne propozojmë një modul përmirësimi pa detyra të quajtur Graf Heterogjen Lingjistike (HLG) për të përmirësuar modelet kineze të paratrajnuara gjuhësh duke integruar njohuritë gjuhësore. Veçanërisht, ne ndërtojmë një grafik hierarkik heterogjene për të modeluar karakteristikat strukturë gjuhësore të gjuhës kineze dhe kryejmë një metodë bazuar në grafik për të përmbledhur dhe konkretizuar informacionin mbi granularitetet e ndryshme të hierarkive gjuhësore kineze.', 'am': 'በቻይና በፊት ተማሪ የቋንቋ ሞዴሌዎች በተቃውሞ የፊደል ቅርጽ መረጃዎችን ለመማር ይጠይቃሉ፤ የቋንቋዊው እውቀት፣ ለምሳሌ ቃላት እና የፍርድ መረጃን ይተዋሉ። ስለዚህ በቋንቋው እውቀትን በመጠቀም የቻይና ቀድሞ ተማሪ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለማበጅል የተባለውን የስራ ነፃ አካባቢ አካባቢ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የቻይና ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢ ቋንቋዎችን ለመሠረት እና በተለየ የቻይና ቋንቋዎች አካባቢዎች ላይ መረጃዎችን ለማሳነስ እና ማሰናከል እና ማሰናከል የሚል የgraph-based ሥርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'ko': '중국이 미리 훈련한 언어 모델은 일반적으로 상하문 문자 정보를 이용하여 표징을 배우지만 언어학 지식, 예를 들어 단어와 문장 정보를 소홀히 한다.따라서 우리는 이질언어학도(HLG)라는 무임무 증강 모듈을 제시하여 언어학 지식을 통합함으로써 중국어 예훈련 언어 모델을 증강시켰다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 차원 이구도를 구축하여 중국어의 특징 언어학 구조를 모의하고 그림을 바탕으로 하는 방법으로 중국어 언어학 차원 구조에서 서로 다른 입도의 정보를 총괄하고 구체화했다.', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները սովորաբար օգտագործում են կոնտեքստոնալ կերպարի ինֆորմացիա, որպեսզի սովորեն ներկայացումներ, չնայած լեզվաբանական գիտելիքներին, օրինակ բառերի և նախադասությունների Hence, we propose a task-free enhancement module termed as Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) to enhance Chinese pre-trained language models by integrating linguistics knowledge.  Հատկապես, մենք կառուցում ենք հիերարխիկական հետերոգեն գծագիր չինական լեզվաբանական կառուցվածքի առանձնահատկությունների մոդելավորման համար և կատարում ենք գծագրային հիմնված մեթոդ, որպեսզի համառոտագրենք և կոնկրետացնենք տեղեկատվությունը չինական լեզվաբանական հիերարխ', 'az': 'Çin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri genellikle təhsil məlumatlarını öyrənmək üçün müxtəlif şəkil məlumatlarını istifadə edir, dillərin elmi, məsələlər sözlər və cümlələr məlumatlarını dərk edirlər. Beləliklə, biz həterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) kimi adlandırılmış iş iş-boş yükselmə modülünü, dil bilgisini integrallaşdırmaq üçün Çin dil modellerini artırmaq üçün təklif edirik. Özellikle, biz Çin dilinin dilində dil quruluğunu modellemək üçün hiyerarşik heterogeneyy grafı inşa edirik, Çin dillərin hiyerarşilərinin müxtəlif granularisi barəsində müəyyən bir məlumat çəkmək və müəyyən etmək üçün grafik tabanlı bir yöntemi idarə edirik.', 'bn': 'পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল সাধারণত প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য প্রতিনিধিত্বের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে, যেখানে ভাষাগত জ্ঞান উপেক্ষা করা হয়, যেমন তাই আমরা একটি কাজের মুক্ত উন্নতি মডিউল প্রস্তাব করছি যার মাধ্যমে হেটারোজেনিয়ান লিঙ্গিস্টিক্স গ্রাফ (এইচএলজি) নামে চীনা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মড বিশেষ করে আমরা চীনা ভাষার চরিত্রের ভাষার কাঠামো মডেল করার জন্য একটি হায়েরার্কিকাল গ্রাফ তৈরি করি এবং চীনা ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষার সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সংক্রান্ত এবং সংশ্লিষ্', 'bs': 'Kineski predobučeni jezički modeli obično iskorištavaju kontekstualne informacije o karakteru kako bi naučili zastupanje, dok ignoriraju jezičke znanje, npr. informacije o reči i rečenici. Stoga predlažemo modul za poboljšanje bez zadataka nazvan Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) kako bi poboljšali kineske predobučene jezičke modele integracijom jezičkih znanja. Posebno, izgradimo hijerarhički heterogeneski grafik kako bi modelili karakteristiku lingvističke strukture kineskog jezika, i provodili na grafiku baziranu metodu kako bi sažetili i konkretirali informacije o različitim granularitima kineskih hijerarhija jezika.', 'ca': "Els models xinesos de llenguatge pré-entrenats normalment explotan la informació de caràcter contextual per aprendre representacions, ignorant el coneixement lingüístic, per exemple la informació de paraules i frases. Per tant, proposem un módul de millorament sense tasca anomenat Gràfic de Lingüística Heterogène (HLG) per millorar els models de llenguatge xinès pré-entrenats integrant el coneixement lingüístic. Concretament, construïm un gràfic heterogène jeràrquic per modelar les característiques de l'estructura lingüística de la llengua xinesa, i fem un mètode basat en el gràfic per resumir i concretizar la informació sobre les diferents granularitats de les jeràrquies lingüístices xineses.", 'cs': 'Čínské předškolené jazykové modely obvykle využívají kontextové informace znaků k učení se reprezentací, přičemž ignorují lingvistické znalosti, například informace o slovech a větách. Proto navrhujeme bezúlohový modul vylepšování nazývaný heterogenní lingvistický graf (HLG), který zlepšuje čínské předškolené jazykové modely integrací lingvistických znalostí. Konkrétně konstruujeme hierarchický heterogenní graf pro modelování charakteristik lingvistické struktury čínského jazyka a provádíme grafovou metodu shrnutí a konkretizace informací o různých granularitách hierarchie čínské lingvistiky.', 'et': 'Hiina eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudelid kasutavad tavaliselt kontekstilist märgiteavet esituste õppimiseks, ignoreerides samas keeleteadmisi, nt sõna- ja lauseteavet. Seetõttu pakume välja ülesandevaba täiustamise mooduli, mida nimetatakse heterogeenseks lingvistika graafikuks (HLG), et parandada hiina eelõpetatud keelemudeleid lingvistika teadmiste integreerimise kaudu. Täpsemalt ehitame hierarhilise heterogeense graafiku hiina keele iseloomuliku struktuuri modelleerimiseks ning teostame graafilise meetodi, et kokku võtta ja konkretiseerida teavet hiina keeleteaduse hierarhiate erinevate detailsuste kohta.', 'fi': 'Kiinalaiset esikoulutetut kielimallit hyödyntävät yleensä kontekstuaalista luonnetietoa oppiakseen representaatioita unohtamatta kielitieteen tietämystä, esim. sana- ja lauseinformaatiota. Siksi ehdotamme tehtävätöntä parannusmoduulia nimeltä Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG) parantamaan kiinalaisia esikoulutettuja kielimalleja integroimalla kielitieteen tietämyksen. Erityisesti rakennamme hierarkkisen heterogeenisen graafin mallintamaan kiinalaisen kielen ominaiskielirakenteen rakennetta ja suoritamme graafisen menetelmän kiteyttääksemme ja konkretisoidaksemme tietoa kiinalaisen kielitieteen hierarkian eri piirteistä.', 'jv': 'Display rounding Kaya, kita ndhukung nggawe modul sing wis disenyong task-free, terus nggambar HeterogNeus Linguistis Graph ngomong, kéné nggawe graf dijeraké êterogèn kanggo model kuwi nggawe ngubah Lingstiki sing dumaten, lan nganggep kuwi nggawe sistem sing basa gambar nggawe sistem sing berarti lan nggawe informasi nggawe granularity sing sampeyan kanggo Kemerdekaan Jejaraké Lingstiki.', 'ha': "Chinese pre-trained language models usually exploit contextual character information to learn representations, while ignoring the linguistics knowledge, e.g., word and sentence information.  Kayya, Munã buɗa wata shirin ƙaranci da ba'a aikata wani aikin da aka yi sura kamar Graf na Hithergen Linguistics (HLG) dõmin a ƙara misãlai na zaman-wa'urar harshe na China da kuma za'a sami da ilmi na harshe. Yana ƙayyade, za'a sami wani grafi na hierogenous dõmin mu motsar masu karatun tsarin linguistics na harshen China, kuma munã tafiyar da wata hanyor a kan grafi don ya sami da kuma za'a concrete information kan karatun masu sãɓãni na takardar linguistics na China.", 'he': 'דוגמני שפה סיניים מאומנים מראש בדרך כלל מנצלים מידע אופי קונטקסטי כדי ללמוד מייצגים, בעוד מתעלמים מהידע השפתי, למשל מידע מילים ומשפטים. לכן, אנו מציעים מודול שיפור ללא משימה שנקרא גרף לינגסטיקה טרוגינית (HLG) כדי לשפר דוגמני שפת סינית מאומנים מראש על ידי האינגרציה של ידע שפתי. במיוחד, אנו בונים גרף היררכי היטרוגני כדי לדוגמא את המבנה השפתי של שפת סינית, ולבצע שיטה מבוססת בגרף כדי לסכם ולקבוע מידע על גרנולריות שונות של היררכיות השפתיות הסיניות.', 'sk': 'Kitajski vnaprej usposobljeni jezikovni modeli običajno izkoriščajo kontekstualne informacije znakov za učenje reprezentacij, hkrati pa ignorirajo jezikoslovno znanje, npr. informacije o besedah in stavkih. Zato predlagamo modul za izboljšanje brez opravil, imenovan Heterogeneni jezikoslovni graf (HLG) za izboljšanje kitajskih vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov z integracijo jezikoslovnega znanja. Natančneje gradimo hierarhični heterogen graf za modeliranje značilnosti jezikoslovne strukture kitajskega jezika in izvajamo grafično metodo za povzetek in konkretizacijo informacij o različnih podrobnostih kitajske jezikoslovne hierarhije.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྐུལ་གྱི་སྐད དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་དེ་ལྟ་བུ་Heterogeneous Linguistics Graph (HLG)ཟིན་པའི་task-free enhancement module སྔོན་གྲངས་རིག Specifically, we construct a hierarchical heterogeneous graph to model the characteristics of linguistics structure of Chinese language, and conduct a graph-based method to summarize and concretize information on different granularities of Chinese linguistics hierarchies.'}
{'en': 'Generating Biographies on ', 'ar': 'تقسيم وإلغاء الضوضاء: التعلم من الملصقات المزعجة في طباعة الكيانات الدقيقة باستخدام تصحيح الخسارة العنقودية', 'fr': "Diviser et réduire le bruit\xa0: apprentissage des étiquettes bruyantes dans le typage d'entités à grain fin avec correction des pertes par cluster", 'pt': 'Dividir e eliminar ruídos: aprendendo com rótulos barulhentos na digitação de entidade refinada com correção de perda em cluster', 'es': 'Dividir y eliminar ruido: aprender de las etiquetas ruidosas en la tipificación detallada de entidades con corrección de pérdidas por clústeres', 'hi': 'विभाजित करें और Denoise: क्लस्टर-वार हानि सुधार के साथ ठीक-दाने वाली इकाई टाइपिंग में शोर लेबल से सीखना', 'zh': '除法与降噪:以聚类失之,学于细粒度实之噪声', 'ja': 'Divide and Denoise ：クラスタワイズ損失補正付きの細かいエンティティタイピングでノイズの多いラベルから学ぶ', 'ru': 'Разделение и снижение шума: обучение на шумных ярлыках при наборе мелких сущностей с кластерной коррекцией потерь', 'ga': 'Roinn agus Denoise: Ag Foghlaim ó Lipéid Noisy in Aonán Mínghráthaithe ag Clóscríobh le Ceartúchán Caillteanais Braisle', 'el': 'Διαίρεση και αποποίηση: Μάθηση από θορυβώδεις ετικέτες σε λεπτόκοκκη πληκτρολόγηση οντοτήτων με τη διόρθωση απώλειας Cluster-σοφή', 'hu': 'Osztás és tagadás: Tanulás a zajos címkékből a finomszemű entitás gépelésében klaszter-bölcs veszteség korrekcióval', 'lt': 'Pasidalijimas ir denojas: mokymasis iš triukšmo etikečių, klasifikuojamų smulkiai grūdytuose subjektuose, kuriuose koreguojami išmintingi nuostoliai', 'it': 'Dividi e rinnega: imparare dalle etichette rumorose nella digitazione di entità a grana fine con correzione della perdita a grappolo', 'mk': 'Дивизирање и деноиза: Научување од звучни етикети во фино-зелени ентитети со корекција на загубата на клустерски мудрости', 'ms': 'Pembahagian dan Denoise: Belajar dari Label Bunyi dalam Jenis Entiti Berbentuk Mudah dengan Pembetulan Kehilangan Cluster-Wise', 'mt': 'Divide and Denoise: Tagħlim mit-Tikketti ta’ l-Istorbju fit-Tip ta’ Entità ta’ Ħruġ Fin b’Korrezzjoni tat-Telf ta’ Raggruppament Ħoss', 'ml': 'വിഭാഗിക്കുക & ഡെനോയിസ്: ക്ലൌസ്റ്റര്\u200d- ജ്ഞാനം നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട പരിശോധനത്തോടൊപ്പം പഠിക്കുക', 'ka': 'Divide and Denoise: Learning from Noisy Labels in Fine-Grained Entity Typing with Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'mn': 'Тайлбарлаж, Дэноис: Хөгжин хэлбэрийн бүтээгдэхүүнээс суралцах', 'no': 'Divider og Denois: Læring frå støyetikettar i finn gråtone entitetstyping med Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'pl': 'Podziel i Denoise: Uczenie się z hałasowych etykiet w drobnoziarnistym pisaniu jednostek z korekcją strat klastrowych', 'ro': 'Împărțiți și denunțați: Învățarea din etichetele zgomotoase în tastarea entităților cu granule fine cu corectarea pierderii înțelepte a clusterului', 'sr': 'Podijelite i Denoise: učenje iz oznake za veštinu u finom građenom entitetu pisanje sa korištenjem gubitka u Cluster-Wise', 'kk': 'Бөлу және Деноис: Бөлу жарлықтардан оқыту', 'si': 'Description', 'so': 'Iska qaybsada iyo Denoise: Waxbarashada alaabta noocyada ee ganacsiga ee hagitaanka ganacsiga ee ganacsiga', 'sv': 'Dela och förneka: Lär dig av bullriga etiketter i finkornig entitetstypning med klustervis förlustkorrigering', 'ta': 'வேறுபாடு', 'ur': 'Divide and Denoise: Noisy Labels in Fine-Grained Entity Typing with Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Phân chia và Denoise: Học từ Nhãn nhiễu trong máy chữ thập tự động, với sửa chữa lỗ hổng Nhóm phân tích.', 'bg': 'Разделяне и обобщаване: учене от шумни етикети при фино-зърнесто писане на обекти с клъстерно-мъдра корекция на загубите', 'hr': 'Podijelite i Denoise: učenje iz oznake za glazbu u lijepom građenom entitetu pisanje s korištenjem gubitka Cluster-Wise', 'da': 'Opdel og benægte: Lære af støjende etiketter i finkornet enhedsskrivning med klynge-vis tabskorrektion', 'id': 'Divide and Denoise: Learning from Noisy Labels in Fine-Grained Entity Typing with Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'nl': 'Verdelen en Denoiseren: Leren van ruisige labels in fijnkorrelige entiteiten typen met clusterwijze verliescorrectie', 'fa': 'تقسیم کردن و دنویس: یاد گرفتن از نقاشی\u200cهای نویسی در برچسب\u200cهای گرانه\u200cای خوب با اصلاح خسارت\u200cهای کلاستر-Wise', 'de': 'Teilen und Denoisieren: Lernen von Rauschen Etiketten in feinkörniger Entity-Typing mit Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'ko': '분할 및 소음 제거: 집합 손실 교정에 기반한 세립도 실체 유형에서의 소음 라벨 학습', 'tr': 'Paýla we Denoýs: Gowy Taýigry Etiketlerden Öwrenmek', 'af': 'Deel en Denois: Leer van Noisy Labels in Fine- Grain Entiteit Tipe met Cluster- Wise Loss Correksie', 'sw': 'Kugawanywa na Denoi: Kujifunza kutoka kwenye mabango yasiyo ya kibiashara katika Kutumia Ujumbe mzuri na Uharibifu wa kupoteza kwa Cluster-wise', 'az': 'Divide and Denoise: Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'sq': 'Divide and Denoise: Learning from Noisy Labels in Fine-Grained Entity Typing with Cluster-Wise Loss Correction', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'hy': "Բաժանվել և դառնալ: Սովորել աղմուկ պիտակներից, որոնք նրբագել են նրբագեղ հասակում' խմբի-խելացի կորստի ուղղությամբ գրելով", 'bs': 'Podijelite i Denoise: učenje iz oznake za glazbu u finom građenom području pisanje sa korištenjem gubitka Cluster-Wise', 'ca': "Divide and Denoise: Aprendre a partir d'etiquetes ruidosos en la tipulació d'entitats fines amb correcció de pèrdua intel·ligent", 'cs': 'Dělit a denoise: Učení se z hlukových štítků v jemnozrnném psaní entit s clusterovou korekcí ztrát', 'bn': 'বিভক্ত এবং ডেনোয়াস: ক্লাস্টার-জ্ঞানী হারানো সংস্কারের মাধ্যমে ভালো ক্রেন্ডারের লেবেল থেকে শিক্ষা শিখা', 'et': 'Jaga ja denoiseeri: õppimine mürakatest märgistest peeneteralise olemi tippimisel klastritarga kadude korrigeerimisega', 'fi': 'Jakaa ja kuvaile: Opi meluisista etiketeistä hienorakeisessa entiteetin kirjoittamisessa klusteriviisaan häviökorjauksen avulla', 'jv': 'Splide and Denoyse: Learning from Nois Label in Fine-Graining Entty Typing with clusterWise lose rection', 'he': 'החלק והדנואיס: ללמוד מתוויות רעשות בכתיבה של איכות מוצגת עם תיקון אבדן חכם', 'sk': 'Razdeli in označi: učenje iz hrupnih oznak pri tipkanju drobnozrnatih entitet s popravkom izgube grozdov modre izgube', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Divide and Denoise: Learning from Noisy Labels in Fine-Grained Entity Typing with Cluster-Wise Loss Correction'}
{'en': 'Generating factual, long-form text such as Wikipedia articles raises three key challenges: how to gather relevant evidence, how to structure information into well-formed text, and how to ensure that the generated text is factually correct. We address these by developing a model for English text that uses a retrieval mechanism to identify relevant supporting information on the web and a cache-based pre-trained encoder-decoder to generate long-form biographies section by section, including citation information. To assess the impact of available web evidence on the output text, we compare the performance of our approach when generating biographies about women (for which less information is available on the web) vs. biographies generally. To this end, we curate a dataset of 1,500 biographies about women. We analyze our generated text to understand how differences in available web evidence data affect generation. We evaluate the factuality, fluency, and quality of the generated texts using automatic metrics and human evaluation. We hope that these techniques can be used as a starting point for human writers, to aid in reducing the complexity inherent in the creation of long-form, factual text.', 'ar': 'حققت طباعة الكيانات الدقيقة (FET) تقدمًا كبيرًا بناءً على الإشراف عن بُعد ولكنها لا تزال تعاني من ضوضاء الملصقات. تعتمد أساليب تعلم الضوضاء الحالية في FET على توزيعات التنبؤ بطريقة مستقلة عن الحالة ، مما يتسبب في مشكلة تحيز التأكيد.\nفي هذا العمل ، نقترح إطار عمل لتصحيح الخسارة قائم على المجموعات يسمى Feature Cluster Loss Correction (FCLC) ، لمعالجة هاتين المشكلتين.\nيقوم FCLC أولاً بتدريب نموذج العمود الفقري الخشن كمستخرج ميزة ومقدر الضوضاء.\nثم يتم تطبيق تصحيح الخسارة على كل مجموعة ميزات ، والتعلم مباشرة من التسميات الصاخبة.\nتظهر النتائج التجريبية على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات عامة أن FCLC تحقق أفضل أداء على الأنظمة التنافسية الحالية. توضح التجارب الإضافية أيضًا أن FCLC مستقرة بالنسبة للمعلمات الفائقة وأنها تساعد في التخفيف من تحيز التأكيد.\nنجد أيضًا أنه في الحالة القصوى لعدم وجود بيانات نظيفة ، لا يزال إطار عمل FCLC يحقق أداءً تنافسيًا.', 'fr': "Le typage d'entité à grain fin (FET) a fait de grands progrès grâce à la supervision à distance, mais souffre toujours du bruit des étiquettes. Les méthodes d'apprentissage du bruit FET existantes reposent sur des distributions de prédiction indépendantes de l'instance, ce qui pose le problème du biais de confirmation. \nDans ce travail, nous proposons un framework de correction des pertes basé sur les clusters appelé Feature Cluster Loss Correction (FCLC), pour résoudre ces deux problèmes. \nLe FCLC entraîne d'abord un modèle de backbone grossier en tant qu'extracteur de caractéristiques et estimateur de bruit. \nLa correction de perte est ensuite appliquée à chaque groupe d'entités, en apprenant directement à partir des étiquettes bruyantes. \nLes résultats expérimentaux sur trois ensembles de données publics montrent que le FCLC obtient les meilleures performances par rapport aux systèmes concurrents existants. Des expériences auxiliaires démontrent en outre que le FCLC est stable aux hyperparamètres et qu'il contribue à atténuer le biais de confirmation. \nNous constatons également que dans le cas extrême où il n'y a pas de données propres, le cadre FCLC atteint toujours des performances concurrentielles.", 'pt': 'A digitação de entidade refinada (FET) fez grandes progressos com base na supervisão à distância, mas ainda sofre com o ruído do rótulo. Os métodos de aprendizado de ruído FET existentes dependem de distribuições de previsão de maneira independente da instância, o que causa o problema de viés de confirmação.\nNeste trabalho, propomos um framework de correção de perdas baseado em clusters denominado Feature Cluster Loss Correction (FCLC), para resolver esses dois problemas.\nO FCLC primeiro treina um modelo de backbone grosseiro como um extrator de recursos e um estimador de ruído.\nA correção de perda é então aplicada a cada cluster de recursos, aprendendo diretamente com os rótulos ruidosos.\nResultados experimentais em três conjuntos de dados públicos mostram que o FCLC alcança o melhor desempenho em relação aos sistemas concorrentes existentes. Experimentos auxiliares demonstram ainda que FCLC é estável para hiperparâmetros e ajuda a mitigar o viés de confirmação.\nTambém descobrimos que no caso extremo de ausência de dados limpos, a estrutura FCLC ainda alcança um desempenho competitivo.', 'es': 'La tipificación detallada de entidades (FET) ha avanzado mucho en función de la supervisión a distancia, pero sigue sufriendo ruido en las etiquetas. Los métodos de aprendizaje de ruido FET existentes se basan en distribuciones de predicción de manera independiente de la instancia, lo que provoca el problema del sesgo de confirmación. \nEn este trabajo, proponemos un marco de corrección de pérdidas basado en clústeres denominado Feature Cluster Loss Correction (FCLC), para abordar estos dos problemas. \nFCLC primero capacita un modelo de estructura básica gruesa como extractor de características y estimador de ruido. \nA continuación, se aplica la corrección de pérdidas a cada clúster de entidades, aprendiendo directamente de las etiquetas ruidosas. \nLos resultados experimentales en tres conjuntos de datos públicos muestran que FCLC logra el mejor rendimiento en comparación con los sistemas de la competencia existentes. Los experimentos auxiliares demuestran además que el FCLC es estable a los hiperparámetros y ayuda a mitigar el sesgo de confirmación. \nTambién encontramos que en el caso extremo de que no haya datos limpios, el marco de FCLC sigue logrando un rendimiento competitivo.', 'hi': 'ठीक दाने वाली एंटिटी टाइपिंग (एफईटी) ने दूर के पर्यवेक्षण के आधार पर बहुत प्रगति की है लेकिन अभी भी लेबल शोर से पीड़ित है। मौजूदा एफईटी शोर सीखने के तरीके एक उदाहरण-स्वतंत्र तरीके से भविष्यवाणी वितरण पर भरोसा करते हैं, जो पुष्टिकरण पूर्वाग्रह की समस्या का कारण बनता है। \nइस काम में, हम इन दो समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए सुविधा क्लस्टर हानि सुधार (FCLC) नामक एक क्लस्टरिंग-आधारित हानि सुधार ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। \nFCLC पहले एक सुविधा चिमटा और शोर अनुमानक के रूप में एक मोटे रीढ़ मॉडल ट्रेन. \nहानि सुधार तब प्रत्येक सुविधा क्लस्टर पर लागू किया जाता है, सीधे शोर लेबल से सीखता है। \nतीन सार्वजनिक डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि FCLC मौजूदा प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रणालियों पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। सहायक प्रयोगों से यह भी पता चलता है कि एफसीएलसी हाइपरपैरामीटर के लिए स्थिर है और यह पुष्टिकरण पूर्वाग्रह को कम करने में मदद करता है। \nहम यह भी पाते हैं कि कोई साफ डेटा के चरम मामले में, FCLC रूपरेखा अभी भी प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है।', 'ja': '細粒度エンティティタイピング（ FET ）は、遠隔監督に基づいて大幅に進歩しましたが、依然としてラベルノイズに悩まされています。 既存のFETノイズ学習方法は、インスタンスに依存しない方法で予測分布に依存し、確認バイアスの問題を引き起こす。 \nこの研究では、この2つの問題に対処するために、Feature Cluster Loss Correction (FCLC)と名付けられたクラスタリングベースの損失補正フレームワークを提案します。 \nFCLCはまず、フィーチャーエクストラクタおよびノイズ推定器として粗骨格モデルをトレーニングします。 \nその後、損失補正が各フィーチャークラスターに適用され、ノイズの多いラベルから直接学習します。 \n3つの公開データセットの実験結果は、FCLCが既存の競合システムよりも最高のパフォーマンスを達成していることを示しています。 補助実験は、FCLCがハイパーパラメータに対して安定であり、確認バイアスを軽減するのに役立つことをさらに示している。 \nまた、クリーンなデータがない極端なケースでは、FCLCフレームワークは依然として競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成していることがわかります。', 'zh': '盖远程监之细粒度体分型(FET)大有所进,而犹染于标签噪声。 今之FET噪声学,赖于独立之占,此所以偏差也。 \n于是条上特征集群损校正(FCLC)基于聚类框架,以决二端。 \nFCLC 先练粗干以为提取器噪声度器。 \n然后将损校正用于特征聚类,径从噪声标中学习。 \n3公共数集上实验结果表明,FCLC胜于今争。 佐实验益明,FCLC对超参数定也,诚有以损之也。 \n未见清净数,FCLC框架犹有竞争力。', 'ru': 'Мелкозернистый тип сущности (FET) добился большого прогресса, основанного на дистанционном надзоре, но все еще страдает от шума этикетки. Существующие методы обучения шуму FET основаны на распределении предсказаний независимым от экземпляра образом, что вызывает проблему смещения подтверждения. \nВ этой работе мы предлагаем основанный на кластеризации механизм коррекции потерь под названием «Коррекция потерь в кластере признаков» (FCLC) для решения этих двух проблем. \nFCLC сначала обучает грубую магистральную модель в качестве устройства выделения признаков и устройства оценки шума. \nКоррекция потерь затем применяется к каждому функциональному кластеру, обучаясь непосредственно из шумных меток. \nЭкспериментальные результаты по трем общедоступным наборам данных показывают, что FCLC достигает лучшей производительности по сравнению с существующими конкурентными системами. Вспомогательные эксперименты дополнительно демонстрируют, что FCLC устойчив к гиперпараметрам и он помогает смягчить смещение подтверждения. \nМы также обнаружили, что в крайнем случае отсутствия чистых данных система FCLC все еще достигает конкурентных показателей.', 'ga': 'Tá dul chun cinn mór déanta ag Clóscríobh Aonáin Mhínnithe (FET) bunaithe ar chian-mhaoirseacht ach tá torann lipéid uirthi fós. Braitheann modhanna foghlama torainn FET atá ann faoi láthair ar dháileacháin réamhaisnéise ar bhealach neamhspleách ar chásanna, rud is cúis le fadhb na laofachta deimhnithe.\nSan obair seo, molaimid creat ceartúcháin caillteanais atá bunaithe ar bhraislí ar a dtugtar Ceartúchán Caillteanais Chnuasaigh Gné (FCLC), chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dá fhadhb seo.\nTraenáil FCLC samhail chnámh droma garbh ar dtús mar eastóscadh gné agus meastóir torainn.\nCuirtear ceartú caillteanais i bhfeidhm ansin ar gach braisle gné, ag foghlaim go díreach ó na lipéid fhuaimiúla.\nLéiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thrí thacar sonraí poiblí go mbaineann FCLC amach an fheidhmíocht is fearr thar na córais iomaíocha atá ann cheana féin. Léiríonn turgnaimh chúnta tuilleadh go bhfuil FCLC cobhsaí i gcoinne hipearpharaiméadair agus go gcuidíonn sé le claonadh deimhnithe a mhaolú.\nFaighimid freisin, i gcás fíor-mhór na sonraí glana, go mbaineann creat FCLC feidhmíocht iomaíoch amach fós.', 'el': 'Η λεπτόκοκκη δακτυλογράφηση οντοτήτων (FET) έχει σημειώσει μεγάλη πρόοδο με βάση την μακρινή εποπτεία, αλλά εξακολουθεί να πάσχει από θόρυβο ετικετών. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι εκμάθησης θορύβου βασίζονται σε διανομές προβλέψεων με τρόπο ανεξάρτητο από την παρουσία, γεγονός που προκαλεί το πρόβλημα της προκατάληψης επιβεβαίωσης.', 'hu': 'A finomszemcsés entitástípus (FET) nagy előrelépést ért el a távoli felügyelet alapján, de még mindig szenved a címke zajától. A meglévő FET zaj tanulási módszerek példányfüggetlen módon támaszkodnak a predikciós eloszlásokra, ami a megerősítési elfogultság problémáját okozza.', 'ka': 'სწორედ განსაზღვრებული ინტერტის ტიპის (FET) გავაკეთე დიდი პროგრესი, მაგრამ მართლაც მართლაც მართლა სიტყვის დაკავშირებულია. Existing FET noise learning methods rely on prediction distributions in an instance-independent manner, which causes the problem of confirmation bias.', 'it': "L'entity typing a grana fine (FET) ha fatto grandi progressi sulla base di una supervisione a distanza, ma soffre ancora del rumore dell'etichetta. I metodi esistenti di apprendimento del rumore FET si basano sulle distribuzioni predittive in modo indipendente dall'istanza, il che causa il problema del bias di conferma.", 'kk': 'Қызықтық нысандар түрі (FET) қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау негізінде көп прогресс жасады, бірақ әлі жарлықтағы дыбысты қалады. Бірақ FET дыбыс үйрену әдістері тәуелдік тәсілдеріне тәуелдік үлестіру тәсілдеріне тәуелді. Бұл құптау көзінің мәселесін жасайды.', 'ms': 'Pencetakan Entiti Berbiji-baik (FET) telah membuat kemajuan yang besar berdasarkan pengawasan jauh tetapi masih menderita oleh bunyi label. Kaedah pembelajaran bunyi FET yang wujud bergantung pada distribusi ramalan dalam cara yang bebas-kejadian, yang menyebabkan masalah bias pengesahan.', 'lt': 'Nuotoline priežiūra pagrįstas smulkių grūdų įrenginių tipavimas (FET) padarė didelę pažangą, tačiau vis dar kenčia nuo ženklinimo triukšmo. Esami FET triukšmo mokymosi metodai grindžiami prognozių paskirstymu nepriklausomai nuo atvejų, dėl kurio kyla patvirtinimo iškraipymo problema.', 'mk': 'Типувањето на фино зелени ентитети (ФЕТ) постигна голем напредок базиран на далечен надзор, но сé уште страда од бучава на етикетата. Постојаните методи на учење на бучава на ФЕТ се зависат од дистрибуциите на предвидување на независен начин од инстанциите, што предизвикува проблем на потврдување предрасуди.', 'ml': 'സുന്ദരിതമായ എന്റിറ്റി ടൈപ്പിംഗ് (FET) ദൂരത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് വളരെ മുന്നോട്ടം ഉണ്ടാക്കി നിലവിലുള്ള FET ശബ്ദം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഒരു ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്റെ സ്വാതന്ത്രമായ വിഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഉറ', 'pl': 'Drobnoziarniste typowanie Entity Typing (FET) poczyniło duże postępy w oparciu o odległy nadzór, ale nadal cierpi na hałas etykiety. Istniejące metody uczenia się hałasu FET opierają się na dystrybucjach predykcyjnych w sposób niezależny od instancji, co powoduje problem biasu potwierdzenia.', 'mn': 'Сайн тарианы нэгж хэвлэх (FET) нь хол даяарлын удирдлагаас үндсэн гайхалтай хөгжлийг гаргаж байна. Гэхдээ тэр үеийн чимээгээс шаналж байна. Ингээд байгаа FET чимээгүй суралцах арга нь тодорхойлолтын хуваарилалтыг тодорхойлдог жишээ нь хамааралтай аргаар хамаарна. Энэ нь тодорхойлолтын алдаа асуудлыг шалтгаалдаг.', 'ro': 'Tiparea entității cu granulație fină (FET) a făcut progrese mari pe baza supravegherii la distanță, dar suferă încă de zgomotul etichetei. Metodele existente de învățare a zgomotului FET se bazează pe distribuțiile de predicție într-o manieră independentă de instanță, ceea ce cauzează problema părtinirii confirmării.', 'sr': 'Fino-grained Entity Typing (FET) napredovao je veliki napredak na temelju dalekog nadzora, ali još uvijek pati od buke etikete. Postoje metode učenja zvuka FET oslanjaju se na distribuciju predviđanja na nezavisni naèin, što uzrokuje problem potvrðenja pristrasnosti.', 'so': 'Dhaqaalaha ganacsiga (FET) waxaa horumarinta aad u badan oo ku saleysan ilaalinta fog, laakiin codka calaamada ayaa weli dhibaataysa. Existing FET noise learning methods rely on prediction distributions in an instance-independent manner, which causes the problem of confirmation bias.', 'si': 'හොඳ ග්\u200dරේන්ඩ් අන්තිත්වය ලිපිනය (FET) දුරස්ථාන ප්\u200dරධානය අධාරිත වෙලා තියෙනවා නමුත් තවමත් ලේබ් ශබ්ද වි ඉතින් ඉතින් FET ශබ්ද විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්ථානයක් නිර්භාවිත විදියට විශ්වාස කරනව', 'no': 'Finn-korn einingstyping (FET) har gjort stor framgang basert på eksterne oversikt, men fortsatt går frå merkeløys. Det eksisterande FET-lysmetode er avhengige på forhåndsvisningar på ein instans-uavhengig måte, som fører til problemet med stadfestingsforhåndsvisning.', 'sv': 'Finkornig entitetstypning (FET) har gjort stora framsteg baserat pﾃ･ fjﾃ､rrﾃｶvervakning men lider fortfarande av etikettbuller. Befintliga FET-brusinlﾃ､rningsmetoder bygger pﾃ･ fﾃｶrutsﾃ､gelsefﾃｶrdelningar pﾃ･ ett instans-oberoende sﾃ､tt, vilket orsakar problemet med konfirmationsbias.', 'ta': 'நல்ல பிடிக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீட்டு தட்டுதல் (FET) தூரத்தில் கண்காணிப்பு அடிப்படையில் மிகவும் முன்னேற்றம் செய்துள்ளது ஆன தற்போதுள்ள FET ஒலி கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறைமைகள் முறைமைகளில் முன்னோட்டத்தை வழங்கும் முறையில் நம்புகிறது, அது உறுதிப்படுத', 'ur': 'پاکیزہ انٹیٹی تایپ (FET) نے دور کی نظر پر بنیاد بہت بڑی پیشرفت کی ہے لیکن اب بھی لیبل غږ سے پڑتی ہے۔ Existing FET noise learning methods rely on prediction distribution in an instance-independent manner, which causes the problem of confirmation bias.', 'mt': 'It-Tip ta’ Entitajiet b’Żrieragħ Fin (FET) għamel progress kbir ibbażat fuq superviżjoni distanti iżda xorta ssofri mill-istorbju tat-tikketta. Il-metodi eżistenti tat-tagħlim tal-istorbju FET jiddependu fuq distribuzzjonijiet ta’ tbassir b’mod indipendenti mill-istanzi, li jikkawża l-problema ta’ preġudizzju għall-konferma.', 'uz': "Name Mavjud FET tovush o'rganish usullari taqdimot tarqatuvchilarga ishlatadi. Bu muammolarni tasdiqlash muvaffaqiyatsiz sababi.", 'vi': 'Thiết bị cảm biến tuyệt vời (FET) đã tạo ra nhiều tiến bộ nhờ sự giám sát xa xôi, nhưng vẫn chịu nhiễu nhãn. Phương pháp học về tiếng động của tập đoàn Liên Minh tồn tại dựa trên phân phát dự đoán một cách đặc biệt, gây ra vấn đề về khuynh hướng xác nhận.', 'bg': 'Финозърнестото писане на обекти (FET) постигна голям напредък въз основа на отдалечен надзор, но все още страда от шум на етикета. Съществуващите методи за учене на шума разчитат на разпределенията на прогнозите по независим от инстанцията начин, което причинява проблема с пристрастяването на потвърждението.', 'nl': 'Fine-granined Entity Typing (FET) heeft grote vooruitgang geboekt op basis van toezicht op afstand, maar heeft nog steeds last van labelruis. Bestaande FET ruisonderwijs-leermethoden zijn gebaseerd op voorspellingsverdelingen op een instance-onafhankelijke manier, wat het probleem van confirmation bias veroorzaakt.', 'da': 'Finkornet Entity Typing (FET) har gjort store fremskridt baseret på fjerntilsyn, men lider stadig af labelstøj. Eksisterende FET støj læringsmetoder er afhængige af forudsigelsesfordelinger på en instans-uafhængig måde, hvilket forårsager problemet med bekræftelse bias.', 'hr': 'Fino-grained entity Typing (FET) napredovao je veliki napredak na temelju dalekog nadzora, ali još uvijek pati od buke etikete. Postoje metode učenja zvuka FET-a oslanjaju se na distribuciju predviđanja na nezavisni način, što uzrokuje problem potvrđenja pristrasnosti.', 'de': 'Feingranulare Entity Typing (FET) hat aufgrund der Fernüberwachung große Fortschritte gemacht, leidet aber immer noch unter Etikettengeräuschen. Bestehende FET Noise Learning Methoden basieren auf Vorhersageverteilungen in einer instanzunabhängigen Weise, was das Problem des Bestätigungsfehlers verursacht.', 'id': 'Pencetakan Entitas Bergandum (FET) telah membuat kemajuan besar berdasarkan pengawasan jauh tetapi masih menderita dari suara label. Metode pembelajaran kebisingan FET yang ada bergantung pada distribusi prediksi secara independen contoh, yang menyebabkan masalah bias konfirmasi.', 'ko': '세립도 실체 유형(FET)은 원격 모니터링을 바탕으로 큰 발전을 이루었지만 라벨 소음이 여전히 존재한다.기존의 FET 소음 학습 방법은 실례와 독립된 예측 분포에 의존하기 때문에 확인 편차 문제를 초래했다.', 'fa': 'نوشتن (FET) شرکت\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cی دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه بر اساس نظارت دور پیشرفت بزرگی کرده است ولی هنوز از صدای نقاشی رنج می\u200cبرد. روش یادگیری صدای FET وجود دارد بر تقسیم پیش بینی به طریق مستقل، که باعث می شود مشکل پیش بینی تصدیق کننده باشد.', 'sw': 'Kutumia Ujumbe wa Entity (FET) umekuwa na maendeleo mazuri kwa kutumia ufuatiliaji wa mbali lakini bado wanaumia sauti za alama. Utawala wa kujifunza kwa sauti za FET unategemea usambazaji wa utabiri kwa namna huru, ambao unasababisha tatizo la kuthibitisha upendeleo.', 'tr': 'FET Öň bar FET gürrüň öwrenmek metodlary öwrenmek üçin önüm döwletlerini bağımsız bir ýagdaýda ynanýar, bu da tassyklanma durumlaryň meselesini sebäp edýär.', 'af': "Fine-graad Entiteit Tipe (FET) het groot vordering gebaseer op afstand supervisie, maar nog lief van etiket ruis. Bestaande FET ruis leer metodes vertrou op voorskou verspreidings in 'n voorbeeld-onafhanklike manier, wat veroorsaak die probleem van bevestiging voorbeeld.", 'sq': 'Njerëzimi i njësive me kokrra të holla (FET) ka bërë përparim të madh bazuar në mbikqyrjen e largët por ende vuan nga zhurma e etiketës. Metodat ekzistuese të mësimit të zhurmës FET mbështeten në shpërndarjen e parashikimit në një mënyrë të pavarur nga rasti, e cila shkakton problem in e paragjykimit të konfirmimit.', 'am': 'Fine-grained Entity Typing (FET) has made great progress based on distant supervision but still suffers from label noise.  የአሁኑ የFET ድምፅ ትምህርት ሥርዓት በተለይ ነፃ በተለየ ልማድ ላይ ይታመናል፡፡', 'az': 'Yaxşı dənli Entity Typing (FET) uzaq gözləmə dayanılmasına görə böyük tədbir etdi, amma hələ də etiket səsindən çəkilir. Existing FET səs öyrənmə metodları tədbir dağıtılmasına təvəkkül edir, bu da təsdiqləmə təsirlərinin problemi olar.', 'hy': 'Լավագույն հասակների տպելը (ՖԵԹ) մեծ առաջընթաց է կատարել հեռավոր վերահսկողության վրա, բայց դեռևս տառապում է պիտակների աղմուկից: Գոյություն ունեցող ՖԵԹ աղմուկի ուսումնասիրության մեթոդները հիմնված են կանխատեսման տարածումների վրա օրինակի անկախ ձևով, ինչը պատճառով է հաստատության կողմնականության խնդիրը:', 'bn': 'ভালো গ্রেফতার এন্টিটি টাইপিং (FET) দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে কিন্তু এখনো লেবেলের শব্দ থেকে কষ্ট পাচ্ছ বিদ্যমান FET শব্দ শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী বিতরণের উপর নির্ভর করে, যার ফলে নিশ্চিত বিভাগের সমস্যা ঘটে।', 'bs': 'Fino-grained entity Typing (FET) napredovao je veliki napredak na temelju dalekog nadzora, ali još uvijek pati od buke etikete. Postoje metode učenja buke FET oslanjaju se na distribuciju predviđanja na nezavisni način, što uzrokuje problem pristrasnosti potvrde.', 'ca': "La tipografia d'entitats fines (FET) ha fet grans progrés basats en supervisió remota però encara pateix soroll d'etiquetes. Els mètodes d'aprenentatge del soroll FET existents depenen de les distribucions de predicció d'una manera independent de les instancies, que causa el problema del bias de confirmació.", 'cs': 'Jemnozrnné typování entit (FET) dosáhlo velkého pokroku na základě vzdáleného dohledu, ale stále trpí šumem štítků. Stávající metody učení šumu FET spoléhají na predikční distribuce instancí nezávislým způsobem, což způsobuje problém konfirmačního biasu.', 'et': 'Peeneteraline olemi tüüpimine (FET) on teinud suuri edusamme kaugse järelevalve põhjal, kuid kannatab siiski märgistuse müra all. Olemasolevad FET müraõppe meetodid tuginevad prognooside jaotusele juhtumist sõltumatul viisil, mis põhjustab kinnituspärasuse probleemi.', 'fi': 'Fine-grained Entity Typing (FET) on edistynyt huomattavasti etävalvonnan perusteella, mutta kärsii silti etikettimelusta. Nykyiset FET-kohinaoppimismenetelmät perustuvat ennustejakaumiin tapauskohtaisesti, mikä aiheuttaa vahvistusvirheen ongelman.', 'jv': 'unit-format Ngubah nambarang nggambar aturan KET kuwi nggawe barang nggawe Kasasah-Ketok', 'sk': 'Finozrnato tipkanje entitet (FET) je doseglo velik napredek na podlagi oddaljenega nadzora, vendar še vedno trpi zaradi hrupa nalepk. Obstoječe metode učenja hrupa FET so neodvisne od primera, kar povzroča problem pristranskosti potrditve.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Tsarin da ke gaba na FET, yana dõgara ga rabannin basĩri da misali-da-ba'a ba, wannan yana da matsalar masu tabbatar da sune-tabar.", 'he': 'טיפוס יחידות מוגזמות (FET) עשה התקדמות גדולה מבוססת על פיקוח מרוחק אבל עדיין סובל מהרעש של תווית. שיטות לימוד רעש FET קיימות תלויות על פיצוי צפייה בדרך עצמאית למקרה, מה שגורם לבעיה של חיזוי אישור.', 'bo': 'རྣམ་པ་(FET)ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་མི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཉེས་བརྟན་པར། Existing FET་བརྡ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སྟོན་རྩིས་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད་པ་དཔེར་ན་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དབང་རྩལ་བཟོ་བར'}
{'en': 'Uncertainty Determines the Adequacy of the Mode and the Tractability of Decoding in Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'ar': 'نحو متانة نماذج تحويل النص إلى SQL ضد اضطراب الجدول الخصامي الطبيعي والواقعي', 'es': 'Hacia la robustez de los modelos de texto a SQL contra la perturbación natural y realista de las tablas adversarias', 'pt': 'Rumo à robustez dos modelos de texto para SQL contra a perturbação natural e realista da tabela adversária', 'fr': 'Vers la robustesse des modèles texte-SQL contre les perturbations de table contradictoires naturelles et réalistes', 'ja': '自然で現実的な対立表摂動に対するテキストツーSQLモデルの堅牢性に向けて', 'zh': '成文本 SQL 模鲁棒性,防自然对抗性表扰', 'hi': 'पाठ की मजबूती की ओर-से-एसक्यूएल मॉडल के खिलाफ प्राकृतिक और यथार्थवादी प्रतिकूल तालिका गड़बड़ी', 'ru': 'На пути к устойчивости текстовых моделей к естественным и реалистичным соперническим возмущениям за таблицами', 'ga': 'I dTreo Neart Múnlaí Téacs-go-SQL In Aghaidh Suaitheadh Tábla Sáraimh Nádúrtha agus Réalaíoch', 'ka': 'ტექსტიდან SQL მოდელების პერტებურაციის პერტუბურაციას დაკავშირება', 'el': 'Προς την ανθεκτικότητα των μοντέλων κειμένου-σε-SQL ενάντια στη φυσική και ρεαλιστική δυσφορία του πίνακα', 'hu': 'A szöveg-SQL modellek robusztussága felé a természetes és realisztikus negatív táblázat perturbációval szemben', 'it': 'Verso la robustezza dei modelli da testo a SQL contro la perturbazione naturale e realistica della tabella avversaria', 'kk': 'Турбациялық және реалистикалық конверсариялық кестенің қарсы мәтіннен SQL үлгілерінің роботтылығына қарсы', 'mk': 'Надвор кон силноста на моделите од текст до SQL против природната и реалната непријателска маса', 'lt': 'Teksto-SQL modelių tvirtumo prieš natūralių ir realistinių prieštaringų lentelių sutrikimus link', 'mt': 'Lejn ir-robustezza tal-mudelli tat-test għal-SQL kontra t-tfixkil tat-tabella avversarja naturali u reali', 'ms': 'Menuju Kekuatan Model Teks-ke-SQL Melawan Pergangguan Jadual Menolak Alam dan Realistik', 'mn': 'Текст-ээс SQL загваруудын тулд байгалийн болон реалист дэмжлэх хүснэгтийн эрчим хүч', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായും റിയാലിസ്റ്റിക്കിക് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികമായ ടേബിള്\u200d പെര്\u200dട്ടിരിപ്പുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായുള്ള പദാവലിയിലേക', 'no': 'Gå til robusthet av tekst- til- SQL- modeller mot naturleg og realistisk rekursarialt tabell', 'ro': 'Către robusteţea modelelor Text-to-SQL împotriva perturbării tabelului adversar natural şi realist', 'pl': 'W kierunku solidności modeli tekstowo-SQL przeciwko naturalnym i realistycznym zakłóceniom tabeli przeciwnych', 'sr': 'Preko robustnosti modela teksta do SQL protiv prirodne i realne konservacijske table perturbacije', 'si': 'පාළුවට SQL මොඩල් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ වෙන්න', 'ta': 'Towards Robustness of Text-to-SQL Models Against Natural and Realistic Adversarial Table Perturbation', 'sv': 'Mot robusthet hos text-till-SQL-modeller mot naturlig och realistisk Adversarial Table Perturbation', 'so': 'Towards Robustness of Text-to-SQL Models Against Natural and Realistic Adversarial Table Perturbation', 'ur': 'Text-to-SQL Models Against Robustness of Natural and Realistic Adversarial Table Perturbation', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Về hướng thao túng cấu trúc văn bản đến SQL chống lại Bảng làm phản ứng tự nhiên và thực tế', 'da': 'På vej mod robusthed af tekst-til-SQL modeller mod naturlige og realistiske adversarial tabel Perturbation', 'hr': 'prema robustnosti modela teksta do SQL protiv prirodne i realne oporavne tablice perturbacije', 'nl': 'Naar robuustheid van tekst-naar-SQL modellen tegen natuurlijke en realistische tabelverstoring', 'bg': 'Към здравина на текстовите модели срещу естествена и реалистична рекламна смущения в таблицата', 'de': 'Zur Robustheit von Text-to-SQL Modellen gegen natürliche und realistische Tabellenstörungen', 'id': 'Towards Robustness of Text-to-SQL Models Against Natural and Realistic Adversarial Table Perturbation', 'fa': 'به سمت استوار مدل متن به SQL علیه تغییرات میز مخالفت طبیعی و واقعیستی', 'ko': '텍스트에서 SQL 모델로 자연과 현실에 대한 적대표 교란의 노봉성', 'tr': 'Metin-we-SQL Modelleriniň Natal we Gerçekçi Ullanyşyk Täblisaň Perturbasyýasy bilen ýüzünlik', 'af': 'Gaan teen Robustness van Teks-na-SQL Models teen Natuurlike en Realistiese Adversariale Tabel Perturbasie', 'sw': 'Mpaka Uzungumzo wa Model za Matambo na SQL dhidi ya Udhalilishaji wa asili na Kihalisi', 'sq': 'Përballë forcës së modeleve tekst-në-SQL kundër shqetësimeve të tabelës kundërshtare natyrore dhe realiste', 'hy': 'Տեքստի-SQL մոդելների ուժեղության դեմ բնական և ռեալիստական հակառակ սեղանի խառնաշփոթման', 'am': 'Media controller element', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক এবং বাস্তবতার বিরুদ্ধে টেবিলের বিরুদ্ধে লেখা থেকে SQL মোডেলের উপরে', 'az': 'T…ôbi…ôtli v…ô Realistik Adversarial Tabel Perturbasyona qarŇüńĪ Metin-to-SQL Modell…ôrinin s…ôrtliyin…ô t…ôr…ôf', 'ca': 'Vers la robustet dels models de text a SQL contra les perturbacions de la taula adversaria natural i realista', 'bs': 'prema robustnosti modela teksta do SQL protiv prirodne i realne konservacijske tablice perturbacije', 'et': 'Teksti-SQL mudelite tugevuse suunas loomuliku ja realistliku tabeli häirete vastu', 'cs': 'K robustnosti text-to-SQL modelů proti přirozené a realistické nepříznivé tabulce', 'fi': 'Kohti teksti-SQL-mallien kestävyyttä luonnollista ja realistista haittavaikutustaulukon häiriötä vastaan', 'jv': 'TOWN RBORUSTS of Text-to-KSL modes Anainst Normal and Actualistal Advertorial table Pertruation', 'sk': 'Proti robustnosti modelov besedila v SQL proti naravnim in realnim oglaševalnim motnjam tabele', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'לעבור לחזקה של דוגמנים טקסט-ל-SQL נגד הפרעה טבעית ומציאותית של שולחן התנגדות', 'bo': 'Towards Robustness of Text-to-SQL Models Against Natural and Realistic Adversarial Table Perturbation'}
{'en': 'In many natural language processing (NLP) tasks the same input (e.g. source sentence) can have multiple possible outputs (e.g. translations). To analyze how this ambiguity (also known as intrinsic uncertainty) shapes the distribution learned by neural sequence models we measure sentence-level uncertainty by computing the degree of overlap between references in multi-reference test sets from two different NLP tasks: machine translation (MT) and grammatical error correction (GEC). At both the sentence- and the task-level, intrinsic uncertainty has major implications for various aspects of search such as the inductive biases in beam search and the complexity of exact search. In particular, we show that well-known pathologies such as a high number of beam search errors, the inadequacy of the mode, and the drop in system performance with large beam sizes apply to tasks with high level of ambiguity such as MT but not to less uncertain tasks such as GEC. Furthermore, we propose a novel exact n-best search algorithm for neural sequence models, and show that intrinsic uncertainty affects model uncertainty as the model tends to overly spread out the probability mass for uncertain tasks and sentences.', 'ar': 'تلعب قوة موزعي النص إلى SQL ضد الاضطرابات العدائية دورًا مهمًا في تقديم تطبيقات موثوقة للغاية. ركزت الدراسات السابقة على طول هذا الخط بشكل أساسي على الاضطرابات في جانب سؤال اللغة الطبيعية ، متجاهلة تنوع الجداول. بدافع من ذلك ، نقترح اضطراب الجدول الخصوم (ATP) كنموذج هجوم جديد لقياس متانة نماذج تحويل النص إلى SQL. بعد هذا الاقتراح ، قمنا برعاية ADVETA ، وهو أول معيار تقييم قوة يضم ATPs طبيعية وواقعية. تشهد جميع الموديلات الحديثة التي تم اختبارها انخفاضًا كبيرًا في الأداء على ADVETA ، مما يكشف عن مجال كبير للتحسين. للدفاع ضد ATP ، نقوم ببناء إطار عمل لتوليد مثال للتدريب العدائي المنهجي مصمم خصيصًا لسياق البيانات الجدولية بشكل أفضل. تُظهر التجارب أن نهجنا يقدم أفضل تحسين في المتانة للنماذج ضد ATP ، بينما يعزز أيضًا بشكل كبير متانة النموذج ضد اضطرابات جانب NL. سنقوم بإصدار ADVETA و code لتسهيل البحث في المستقبل.', 'fr': "La robustesse des analyseurs Text-to-SQL face aux perturbations contradictoires joue un rôle crucial dans la fourniture d'applications hautement fiables. Les études précédentes dans ce sens se sont concentrées principalement sur les perturbations du côté question du langage naturel, en négligeant la variabilité des tableaux. C'est pourquoi nous proposons l'Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) comme nouveau paradigme d'attaque pour mesurer la robustesse des modèles Text-to-SQL. Suite à cette proposition, nous organisons ADVETA, le premier benchmark d'évaluation de la robustesse présentant des ATP naturels et réalistes. Tous les modèles de pointe testés subissent des baisses de performances spectaculaires sur ADVETA, révélant ainsi une marge d'amélioration significative. Pour nous défendre contre l'ATP, nous construisons un cadre de génération d'exemples de formation contradictoire systématique adapté pour une meilleure contextualisation des données tabulaires. Les expériences montrent que notre approche apporte aux modèles la meilleure amélioration de la robustesse par rapport à l'ATP, tout en augmentant considérablement la robustesse du modèle contre les perturbations côté NL. Nous publierons ADVETA et du code pour faciliter les recherches futures.", 'pt': 'A robustez dos analisadores Text-to-SQL contra perturbações adversárias desempenha um papel crucial na entrega de aplicativos altamente confiáveis. Estudos anteriores nessa linha focaram principalmente em perturbações no lado da questão da linguagem natural, negligenciando a variabilidade das tabelas. Motivados por isso, propomos o Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) como um novo paradigma de ataque para medir a robustez de modelos Text-to-SQL. Seguindo essa proposta, selecionamos o ADVETA, o primeiro benchmark de avaliação de robustez com ATPs naturais e realistas. Todos os modelos de última geração testados apresentam quedas dramáticas de desempenho no ADVETA, revelando um espaço significativo para melhorias. Para a defesa contra o ATP, construímos uma estrutura sistemática de geração de exemplos de treinamento adversário adaptada para melhor contextualização dos dados tabulares. Experimentos mostram que nossa abordagem traz a melhor melhoria de robustez dos modelos contra ATP, enquanto também aumenta substancialmente a robustez do modelo contra perturbações do lado NL. Vamos liberar o ADVETA e o código para facilitar pesquisas futuras.', 'es': 'La solidez de los analizadores de texto a SQL contra perturbaciones adversas desempeña un papel crucial en la entrega de aplicaciones altamente confiables. Los estudios anteriores en esta línea se centraron principalmente en las perturbaciones en el lado de las preguntas del lenguaje natural, descuidando la variabilidad de las tablas. Motivados por esto, proponemos la perturbación de tablas adversarias (ATP) como un nuevo paradigma de ataque para medir la solidez de los modelos de texto a SQL. Siguiendo esta propuesta, seleccionamos ADVETA, el primer punto de referencia de evaluación de robustez con ATP naturales y realistas. Todos los modelos de última generación probados experimentan notables caídas de rendimiento en ADVETA, lo que revela un margen de mejora significativo. Para defendernos contra la ATP, creamos un marco de generación de ejemplos de entrenamiento contradictorio sistemático diseñado para una mejor contextualización de los datos tabulares. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro enfoque aporta a los modelos la mejor mejora de la robustez frente al ATP, al tiempo que aumenta sustancialmente la robustez del modelo contra las perturbaciones del lado NL. Publicaremos ADVETA y el código para facilitar la investigación futura.', 'ja': '対立摂動に対するText - to - SQLパーサーの堅牢性は、非常に信頼性の高いアプリケーションを提供する上で重要な役割を果たします。 この線に沿った以前の研究は、主に自然言語の質問側の摂動に焦点を当てており、表の変動性を無視していた。 これに動機づけられて、テキストツーSQLモデルの堅牢性を測定するための新しい攻撃パラダイムとして、Adversarial Table Perturbation （ ATP ）を提案します。 この提案に従って、私たちは自然で現実的なATPを特徴とする最初の堅牢性評価ベンチマークであるADVETAをキュレーションします。 テストされた最先端モデルはすべて、ADVETAで劇的なパフォーマンス低下を経験し、大幅な改善の余地があることが明らかになりました。 ATPを防御するために、テーブルデータのコンテキスト化を改善するためにカスタマイズされた、体系的な対抗訓練のサンプル生成フレームワークを構築します。 実験は、我々のアプローチが、ＡＴＰに対するモデルの最良の堅牢性改善をもたらすと同時に、ＮＬ側の摂動に対するモデルの堅牢性も実質的に向上させることを示している。 今後の調査を容易にするため、ADVETAとコードをリリースします。', 'zh': '夫文本 SQL 解析器对抗性扰者健壮性付高可恃之应用程序起着至重之用也。 前此条线者,总归于自然语言,而忽于表格之可变性。 受此启发,抗表扰动(ATP)以为新攻范,量文本于SQL之健壮性。 遵此议,吾谋ADVETA,此一有自然ATP之稳健性也。 凡试者先进型号于ADVETA皆历戏剧性性性降,显者改入空间。 防御 ATP,构一统以抗训练示例生成框架,当框架专为善表格数情化而定制。 实验者,所以为ATP之至鲁棒性,大大提高之于NL侧之鲁棒性也。 吾将发ADVETA代码,以趣来者。', 'hi': 'प्रतिकूल बाधाओं के खिलाफ पाठ-से-एसक्यूएल पार्सर की मजबूती अत्यधिक विश्वसनीय अनुप्रयोगों को वितरित करने में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाती है। इस लाइन के साथ पिछले अध्ययनों ने मुख्य रूप से प्राकृतिक भाषा के प्रश्न पक्ष में गड़बड़ी पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया, तालिकाओं की परिवर्तनशीलता की उपेक्षा की। इससे प्रेरित होकर, हम टेक्स्ट-टू-एसक्यूएल मॉडल की मजबूती को मापने के लिए एक नए हमलावर प्रतिमान के रूप में प्रतिकूल तालिका क्षोभ (एटीपी) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस प्रस्ताव के बाद, हम ADVETA, प्राकृतिक और यथार्थवादी एटीपी की विशेषता वाले पहले मजबूती मूल्यांकन बेंचमार्क को क्यूरेट करते हैं। सभी परीक्षण किए गए अत्याधुनिक मॉडल ADVETA पर नाटकीय प्रदर्शन बूंदों का अनुभव करते हैं, जिससे सुधार के महत्वपूर्ण कमरे का खुलासा होता है। एटीपी के खिलाफ रक्षा करने के लिए, हम सारणीबद्ध डेटा के बेहतर संदर्भीकरण के लिए एक व्यवस्थित प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण उदाहरण पीढ़ी के ढांचे का निर्माण करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण एटीपी के खिलाफ मॉडल को सबसे अच्छी मजबूती में सुधार लाता है, जबकि एनएल-साइड गड़बड़ी के खिलाफ मॉडल मजबूती को भी काफी हद तक बढ़ावा देता है। हम भविष्य के अनुसंधान को सुविधाजनक बनाने के लिए ADVETA और कोड जारी करेंगे।', 'ru': 'Надежность парсеров Text-to-SQL против сопернических возмущений играет решающую роль в предоставлении высоконадежных приложений. Предыдущие исследования в этом направлении в основном были сосредоточены на возмущениях в естественной языковой стороне вопроса, игнорируя изменчивость таблиц. Исходя из этого, мы предлагаем пертурбацию состязательных таблиц (ATP) в качестве новой атакующей парадигмы для измерения устойчивости моделей преобразования текста в SQL. Следуя этому предложению, мы курируем ADVETA, первый эталон оценки устойчивости, характеризующийся естественными и реалистичными АТФ. Все протестированные современные модели испытывают резкое падение производительности ADVETA, что открывает значительные возможности для улучшения. Для защиты от ATP мы создаем систематическую структуру генерации примеров обучения соперников, предназначенную для лучшей контекстуализации табличных данных. Эксперименты показывают, что наш подход обеспечивает наилучшее улучшение устойчивости моделей по отношению к АТФ, а также существенно повышает устойчивость моделей по отношению к возмущениям со стороны NL. Мы выпустим ADVETA и код для облегчения будущих исследований.', 'ga': 'Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag stóinseacht na parsálaithe Téacs-go-SQL i gcoinne suaitheadh sáraíochta maidir le feidhmchláir an-iontaofa a sheachadadh. Dhírigh staidéir roimhe seo feadh na líne seo go príomha ar shuaiteadh ar thaobh cheist na teanga nádúrtha, ag déanamh faillí in inathraitheacht na dtáblaí. Spreagtha ag seo, molaimid an Sárú Tábla Sáraimh (ATP) mar pharaidím ionsaithe nua chun stóinseacht na samhlacha Téacs-go-SQL a thomhas. Ag leanúint leis an moladh seo, déanaimid coimeád ar ADVETA, an chéad thagarmharc meastóireachta stóinseachta a bhfuil ATPanna nádúrtha agus réalaíocha aige. Tá laghduithe suntasacha feidhmíochta ar ADVETA i ngach samhail den scoth a tástáladh, rud a léiríonn go bhfuil feabhas suntasach ann. Chun cosaint in aghaidh ATP, tógaimid creat giniúna samplaí traenála sáraíochta córasach atá oiriúnaithe chun sonraí tábla a chur i gcomhthéacs níos fearr. Léiríonn turgnaimh go dtugann ár gcur chuige an feabhas is fearr ar stóinseacht i gcoinne ATP, agus go gcuireann sé go mór le stóinseacht na samhla i gcoinne suaitheadh taobh an NL. Eiseoimid ADVETA agus cód chun éascú a dhéanamh ar thaighde amach anseo.', 'hu': 'A Text-to-SQL elemzők ellentétes zavarokkal szembeni robusztussága kulcsfontosságú szerepet játszik a rendkívül megbízható alkalmazások előállításában. A korábbi tanulmányok ezen a vonalon elsősorban a természetes nyelv kérdési oldalának perturbációira összpontosítottak, figyelmen kívül hagyva a táblázatok változékonyságát. Ennek motiválására az Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) egy új támadó paradigmaként javasoljuk a Text-to-SQL modellek robusztusságának mérésére. Ezt követően az ADVETA-t, az első robusztus értékelési referenciaértéket, amely természetes és reális ATP-ket tartalmaz. Minden tesztelt, korszerű modell drámai teljesítménycsökkenést tapasztal az ADVETA-n, ami jelentős fejlődési lehetőséget mutat. Az ATP elleni védelem érdekében egy szisztematikus ellenséges képzési példa generációs keretrendszert építünk ki, amely a táblázatos adatok jobb kontextualizálására szolgál. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk a modellek legjobb robusztusságának javítását eredményezi az ATP ellen, ugyanakkor jelentősen növeli a modell robusztusságát a NL-oldali zavarok ellen. A jövőbeli kutatások megkönnyítése érdekében kiadjuk az ADVETA-t és a kódot.', 'el': "Η ανθεκτικότητα των αναλυτών κειμένου-σε-παίζει σημαντικό ρόλο στην παροχή εξαιρετικά αξιόπιστων εφαρμογών. Προηγούμενες μελέτες κατά μήκος αυτής της γραμμής επικεντρώθηκαν κυρίως σε διαταραχές στην πλευρά των ερωτήσεων της φυσικής γλώσσας, παραμένοντας την μεταβλητότητα των πινάκων. Με κίνητρο γι' αυτό, προτείνουμε την Αντιστατική Διαταραχή Πίνακα (ΑΤΡ) ως ένα νέο πρότυπο επίθεσης για τη μέτρηση της ανθεκτικότητας των μοντέλων κειμένου-σε-SQL. Ακολουθώντας την πρόταση αυτή, επιμελούμε το πρώτο κριτήριο αξιολόγησης ανθεκτικότητας που περιλαμβάνει φυσικά και ρεαλιστικά ΑΤΡ. Όλα τα δοκιμασμένα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας βιώνουν δραματικές μειώσεις απόδοσης στο σύστημα αποκαλύπτοντας σημαντικό περιθώριο βελτίωσης. Για την υπεράσπιση ενάντια στην ΑΤΡ, χτίζουμε ένα συστηματικό πλαίσιο δημιουργίας παραδειγμάτων κατάρτισης προσαρμοσμένο για καλύτερη πλαισίωση των πινάκων δεδομένων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας φέρνει την καλύτερη βελτίωση της ανθεκτικότητας των μοντέλων έναντι της ΑΤΡ, ενώ παράλληλα ενισχύει σημαντικά την ανθεκτικότητα των μοντέλων έναντι διαταραχών στην πλευρά της NL. Θα απελευθερώσουμε και κώδικα για τη διευκόλυνση της μελλοντικής έρευνας.", 'ka': 'ტექსტის და SQL პარასერების ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან გარდამუშავებელი პერტუბრაციების შემდეგ გარდამუშავებელი პროლია. ამ ხაზის წინასწარმოდგენების წინასწარმოდგენება პერტუბურაციებისთვის, სახელსაწარმოდგენებული ენის კითხვის მხარეს, სახელსაწარმოდგენებული ცვლილების ცვლილებ ამით მოტივარებული, ჩვენ ახალი ატარიფიკაციის პარადიგმა, როგორც ტექსტი-დან SQL მოდელების ძალიან ძალიან გაზომარებას მივიღებთ. ამ პროგრამის შემდეგ, ჩვენ ADVETA-ს გადაწყვეტით, პირველი ძალიან განსაზღვრებული ბენქმარი, რომელიც ნაირადი და რეალური ATP-ები აქვს. ყველა ტესტირებული მოდელების მოცდილობა დირამატიკური გამოცდილობა ADVETA-ზე გადარჩენა, რომლებიც აღმოჩენა მნიშვნელოვანი სახლეში გაუკეთება. ATP-ის შესახებ, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სისტემატიური განაკეთებული განაკეთებული მაგალითების სამუშაო განაკეთება, რომელიც უკეთესი ტექსტუალური მონაცემების შესახე Experiments show that our approach brings models best robustness improvement against ATP, while also substantially boost model robustness against NL-side perturbations. ჩვენ ADVETA-ს და კოდის გახსნა, რომ მომავალე შესწავლობა.', 'it': "La robustezza dei parser Text-to-SQL contro le perturbazioni avversarie gioca un ruolo cruciale nella fornitura di applicazioni altamente affidabili. Studi precedenti su questa linea si sono concentrati principalmente sulle perturbazioni nel lato interrogativo del linguaggio naturale, trascurando la variabilità delle tabelle. Motivati da questo, proponiamo l'Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) come nuovo paradigma attaccante per misurare la robustezza dei modelli Text-to-SQL. Seguendo questa proposta, curiamo ADVETA, il primo benchmark di valutazione della robustezza con ATP naturali e realistici. Tutti i modelli all'avanguardia testati sperimentano notevoli cali di prestazioni su ADVETA, rivelando notevoli margini di miglioramento. Per difendersi dall'ATP, costruiamo un framework sistematico di generazione di esempi di formazione avversaria su misura per una migliore contestualizzazione dei dati tabulari. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro approccio apporta il miglior miglioramento della robustezza dei modelli contro l'ATP, aumentando al contempo notevolmente la robustezza dei modelli contro le perturbazioni del lato NL. Rilasciamo ADVETA e codice per facilitare la ricerca futura.", 'lt': 'Teksto-SQL analizatorių patikimumas prieš priešingus perturbacijas atlieka labai svarbų vaidmenį įgyvendinant labai patikimas programas. Ankstesniuose tyrimuose šia kryptimi daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama perturbacijoms natūralios kalbos klausimų pusėje, neatsižvelgiant į lentelių kintamumą. Atsižvelgdami į tai, mes siūlome priešingos lentelės pertvarkymą (ATP) kaip naują užpuolimo paradigm ą, siekiant įvertinti teksto-SQL modelių patikimumą. Atsižvelgdami į šį pasiūlymą rengiame ADVETA, pirmąjį patikimumo vertinimo kriterijų, kuriame pateikiami gamtiniai ir realistiniai ATP. Visiems išbandytiems moderniausiems modeliams ADVETA veiksmingumas labai mažėja, o tai rodo, kad gerokai pagerėjo. Siekiant apsisaugoti nuo ATP, sukuriame sistemingą prieštaringo mokymo pavyzdžių generacijos sistemą, pritaikytą geresniam lentelių duomenų kontekstualizavimui. Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris užtikrina geriausią patikimumo modelių gerinimą ATP atžvilgiu, o taip pat gerokai padidina modelio patikimumą NL perturbacijoms. Mes paskelbsime ADVETA ir kodeksą, kad palengvintume būsimus mokslinius tyrimus.', 'mk': 'Сигурноста на анализаторите текст-до-SQL против противниците игра клучна улога во обезбедувањето на високо доверливи апликации. Претходните студии по оваа линија се фокусираа главно на пертурбирањата на страната на природниот јазик прашање, заборавајќи ја варијабилноста на таблите. Мотивирана од ова, ја предлагаме противничката маса Пертурбација (АТП) како нов напаѓачки парадигм за мерење на силноста на моделите од текст до SQL. Following this proposition, we curate ADVETA, the first robustness evaluation benchmark featuring natural and realistic ATPs.  Сите тестирани најдобри модели искусуваат драматични пади на АДВЕТА, откривајќи значителна простор за подобрување. За да се одбраниме против АТП, градиме систематска опасна обука за пример генерација рамка направена за подобра контекстуализација на табуларните податоци. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот пристап носи најдобро подобрување на моделите на силноста против АТП, истовремено значително ја зајакнува и силноста на моделот против пертурбирањата на страната на НЛ. Ќе го ослободиме АДВЕТА и кодот за олеснување на идното истражување.', 'kk': 'Мәтін- мен SQL талдаушыларының қарсы қарсы қарсы қарсы қуаттылығы өте сенімді қолданбаларды жеткізу үшін маңызды роль ойлады. Бұл жолдың алдыңғы зерттеулері негізінде табиғи тіл сұрақтарының көтерілігіне көтерілген, кестелердің айнымалылығын елемейді. Бұл көмектесу үшін біз мәтін- мен SQL үлгілерінің құндылығын өлшеу үшін "Adversarial Table Perturbation" (ATP) дегенді жаңа атқару парадигмі ретінде ұсындық. Бұл ұсыныстан кейін, бірінші құндылық оқу бағдарламасын табиғи және реалистикалық АТП дегенді өзгертеміз. Барлық сынақтардың күй- жай моделдері ADVETA-ның драматикалық әдістерін түсіндіреді, маңызды жақсарту орынын көрсетеді. ATP қарсы қорғау үшін, қойындылық деректерді жақсы контекстуализациялау үшін жүйелік негатриялық оқыту үшін бағдарламаны құрып жатыр. Тәжірибелер біздің тәсіліміміз ATP-ге қарсы ең құндылық үлгілерін жақсарту үлгілерін көрсетеді, сондай-ақ NL-жақтағы қарсы құндылық үлгілеріне қарсы құ АДВЕТА және код болашақ зерттеулерді көмектесу үшін шығарып береміз.', 'ms': 'Kekuatan penghurai Teks-ke-SQL terhadap gangguan musuh bermain peran penting dalam menyediakan aplikasi yang sangat dipercayai. Pelajaran terdahulu sepanjang garis ini terutama fokus pada gangguan di sisi soalan bahasa semulajadi, mengabaikan variabiliti jadual. Motivated by this, we propose the Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) as a new attacking paradigm to measure robustness of Text-to-SQL models. Setelah cadangan ini, kami mengkurasi ADVETA, tanda referensi penilaian ketat pertama yang mengandungi ATP semulajadi dan realistik. Semua model terbaik diuji mengalami prestasi dramatik turun pada ADVETA, mengungkapkan ruang yang signifikan penambahan. Untuk mempertahankan ATP, kita membina sistem latihan musuh contoh generasi kerangka yang disesuaikan untuk kontekstualisasi data tabular yang lebih baik. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita membawa model yang terbaik kebahagiaan terhadap ATP, sementara juga meningkatkan kebahagiaan model terhadap gangguan sisi NL. Kami akan melepaskan ADVETA dan kod untuk memudahkan penyelidikan masa depan.', 'ml': 'വിരോധമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനെതിരായി പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും എസ്ക്യൂഎല്\u200d പാര്\u200dസര്\u200dമാരുടെ റോസ്റ്റ് പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ വിശ്വസ്തനായ പ്രയ ഈ വരിയിലൂടെ മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ ഭാഷയുടെ ഭാഗത്തുള്ള പ്ര ഇതില്\u200d നിന്നും മാറ്റപ്പെടുത്തിയാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ആക്രമിക്കുന്ന ടേബിള്\u200d പെര്\u200dട്ടറേഷന്\u200d (ATP) പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. പദാവലിയില്\u200d നി ഈ പരിപാടിയുടെ പിന്നാലെ നമ്മള്\u200d ADVETA നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നു, ആദ്യത്തെ റോബ്സ്റ്റ് വിലാസപ്രകാരം പ്രകൃതിയും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ATPകള എല്ലാ പരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്റ്റേറ്റ് - ആര്\u200dട്ട് മോഡലുകളുടെയും മുന്\u200dഗണന മുറിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ മുറ ATP-നെതിരായി പ്രതിരോധിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തികമായ പ്രതികാര പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണത്തിന് തലമു പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടികള്\u200d ATP-നെതിരെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച റോബ്സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്,  ഭാവിയുടെ പരിശോധന സുരക്ഷിതമാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ADVETA പിന്നെ കോഡും വിടും.', 'mn': 'Текст-ээс SQL-ээс зөрчилдөөн эсэргүүцлийн эсрэг хүчирхийлэгчийн хүчтэй байдал нь маш итгэлтэй хэрэглээ гаргах чухал үүрэг юм. Энэ шулууны өмнөх судалгаа нь байгалийн хэл асуултын асуудал дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа анхаарлаа төвлөрсөн, хүснэгт өөрчлөлтийг үгүйсгэдэг. Үүнээс хөдөлгөөнтэй, бид Текст-ээс SQL загварын хүчтэй байдлыг хэмжүүлэх шинэ дайралтын парадигм болгоно. Эдгээр санал дэвшүүлснээр бид АДВЕТА-г сайжруулж, байгалийн, бодит АТР-г харуулдаг анхны хүчтэй дүгнэлтийн багц. Бүх шалгалттай урлагийн загварууд АДВЕТА дээр гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг харуулж, сайжруулах өрөөг илэрхийлдэг. АТР-ын эсрэг хамгаалахын тулд бид систематикийн эсрэг дасгал суралцах жишээ бий болгож тайлбарлалтын өгөгдлийн сайхан нөхцөл байдлыг илүү сайжруулахын тулд зохицуул Эмчилгээний туршилт нь бидний арга загвар нь АТР-ын эсрэг хамгийн хүчтэй байдал сайжруулах загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Мөн NL-ын эсрэг загваруудыг илүү хүчтэй болгодог. Бид ирээдүйн судалгааны тулд АДВЕТА болон кодыг ашиглах болно.', 'mt': 'Ir-robustezza tal-analizzaturi tat-test għal SQL kontra perturbazzjonijiet avversarji għandha rwol kruċjali fit-twassil ta’ applikazzjonijiet affidabbli ħafna. Studji preċedenti fuq din il-linja ffukaw primarjament fuq il-perturbazzjonijiet fin-naħa tal-kwistjoni tal-lingwa naturali, filwaqt li injoraw il-varjabbiltà tat-tabelli. Minħabba dan, qed nipproponu l-Perturbazzjoni tat-Tabella Avversi (ATP) bħala paradigm a ġdida ta’ attakk biex titkejjel is-robustezza tal-mudelli Test-SQL. Wara din il-proposta, aħna nikuraw ADVETA, l-ewwel punt ta’ riferiment għall-evalwazzjoni tar-robustezza li għandu ATPs naturali u realistiċi. Il-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati kollha ttestjati jesperjenzaw tnaqqis drammatiku fil-prestazzjoni fuq ADVETA, li juri kamra sinifikanti ta’ titjib. Biex niddefendu kontra l-ATP, nibnu qafas sistematiku ta’ taħriġ avversarju eżempju ta’ ġenerazzjoni mfassal għal kuntestwalizzazzjoni a ħjar tad-dejta tabulari. L-esperimenti juru li l-approċċ tagħna jġib l-aħjar titjib fir-robustezza tal-mudelli kontra l-ATP, filwaqt li jsaħħaħ b’mod sostanzjali r-robustezza tal-mudell kontra l-perturbazzjonijiet min-naħa tal-NL. Ser nirrilaxxaw ADVETA u kodiċi biex niffaċilitaw ir-riċerka futura.', 'pl': 'Solidność parserów Text-to-SQL przed zakłóceniami przeciwnymi odgrywa kluczową rolę w dostarczaniu bardzo niezawodnych aplikacji. Poprzednie badania wzdłuż tej linii skupiały się przede wszystkim na zakłóceniach w języku naturalnym, zaniedbując zmienność tabel. Dzięki temu proponujemy Perturbację tabeli przeciwników (ATP) jako nowy paradygmat atakujący do pomiaru solidności modeli Text-to-SQL. Zgodnie z tą propozycją opracowujemy ADVETA, pierwszy benchmark oceny solidności z naturalnymi i realistycznymi ATP. Wszystkie testowane najnowocześniejsze modele doświadczają dramatycznych spadków wydajności ADVETA, ujawniając znaczną możliwość poprawy. W celu obrony przed ATP, budujemy systematyczny system generowania przykładów szkoleniowych przeciwników dostosowany do lepszej kontekstualizacji danych tabelarycznych. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasze podejście przynosi najlepszą poprawę wytrzymałości modeli w stosunku do ATP, a jednocześnie znacznie zwiększa solidność modelu na zakłócenia po stronie NL. Udostępnimy ADVETA i kod ułatwiający przyszłe badania.', 'ro': 'Robustetatea parserelor Text-to-SQL împotriva perturbărilor adversare joacă un rol crucial în furnizarea de aplicații extrem de fiabile. Studiile anterioare de-a lungul acestei linii s-au concentrat în principal asupra perturbărilor din partea de întrebare a limbajului natural, neglijând variabilitatea tabelelor. Motivați de acest lucru, propunem Perturbarea Tabelului Adversarial (ATP) ca o nouă paradigmă de atac pentru a măsura robustețea modelelor Text-to-SQL. Urmând această propunere, curățăm ADVETA, primul benchmark de evaluare a robusteții cu ATP-uri naturale și realiste. Toate modelele testate de ultimă generaţie experimentează scăderi dramatice de performanţă pe ADVETA, dezvăluind spaţiu semnificativ de îmbunătăţire. Pentru a ne apăra împotriva ATP, construim un cadru sistematic de generare a exemplelor de formare adversară adaptat pentru o mai bună contextualizare a datelor tabelare. Experimentele arată că abordarea noastră aduce cea mai bună îmbunătățire a robusteții modelelor împotriva ATP, în timp ce sporește substanțial robustețea modelului împotriva perturbărilor din partea NL. Vom lansa ADVETA și codul pentru a facilita cercetarea viitoare.', 'si': 'Text-to-SQL පරීක්ෂකයන්ගේ ශක්තිමතාවය විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් විරුද්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්ණ භ මේ ලායින් එක්ක මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය භාෂා ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ප මේකෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය (ATP) වෙනුවෙන් අලුත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්  මේ සැලසුම් පස්සේ අපි ADVETA විශ්වාස කරනවා, පලවෙනි ශක්තිමත් විශ්වාස කරන්න බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් ස්වභාවිත සහ ඇත්ති සියළුම පරීක්ෂා කල්ලාගේ ස්ථිතියේ ස්ථිතියේ විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත ATP විරුද්ධ ආරක්ෂා කරන්න, අපි පද්ධතිය විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා උදාහරණය සි පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදියට ATP විරුද්ධ හොඳම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ අපි ADVETA සහ කෝඩ් නිදහස් කරන්නම් අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය සහාය කරන්න.', 'sr': 'Snaga analizatora teksta do SQL protiv neprijateljskih perturbacija igra ključnu ulogu u ispunjavanju visoko pouzdanih aplikacija. Prethodna ispitivanja duž te linije uglavnom se fokusirala na perturbacije na prirodnoj strani pitanja jezika, zaboravljajući variabilnost stolova. Pod motivacijom ovoga, predlažemo prosvjetiteljsku tablu Perturbaciju (ATP) kao novu paradigmu napada kako bi mjerili robustnost modela teksta do SQL-a. Nakon ovog prijedloga, uključili smo ADVETA, prvu kritiku za procjenu robotnosti koja uključuje prirodne i realne ATP-e. Svi testirani modeli stanja umjetnosti iskuse dramatične funkcije padaju na ADVETA, otkrivajući značajnu sobu poboljšanja. Da bi se odbranili protiv ATP, izgradili smo sistematski okvir proizvodnje neprijateljskog treninga koji je prilagođen za bolju kontekstualizaciju tabularnih podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš pristup donosi najbolji poboljšanje robote protiv ATP-a, dok takođe značajno povećava model robustnosti protiv perturbacija na NL-u. Pustit ćemo ADVETA i kodiranje da olakšamo buduće istraživanje.', 'so': "Dhaqdhaqaaqa baarlamayaasha qoraalka-ilaa-SQL ee ka gees ah rabshadooda waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah in loo bixiyo codsiyada aad u aamin karo. Waxbarashada hore ee ku socday qoraalkaas waxay ugu horeyn lahaayeen iskala xiriirta su'aalaha afka dabiicadda ah, iyagoo ka jeeda isbedelka looxyada. Tan waxaa dhaqdhaqaaqsan, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qalabka warqadda (ATP) oo ah mid cusub weeraraya si aan u qiyaasno qalabka qoraalka-ilaa-SQL. Markaas waxan la soo jeeday, waxaynu baranaynaa ADVETA, qiimeynta qofka ugu horreeya ee kharashka ah oo ah ATPs dabiicadda iyo runta ah. Dhammaan qaababka loo tijaabiyey oo dhan waxay ku jiraan samooyin aad u dhaqdhaqaaq ah oo aad u muuqata ADVETA, wuxuuna muujiyaa qol aad u weyn oo hagaajinta. Si aan ATP uga daafacno, waxaan dhisaynaa tusaale ahaan tababar-cadaawayaal ah, taas oo loo qoray si ka fiican u fiirsashada macluumaadka tababarka ah. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu keenaa tusaalooyin u wanaagsan oo ka horumarinta dhaqaalaha ATP, xitaa sidoo kale waxaa lagu kordhiyaa dharka modelka oo ka gees ah dhaqdhaqaalaha NL-ka. We will release ADVETA and code to facilitate future research.", 'no': 'Den kraftigheten av teksttolkarar til SQL mot adversariale perturbasjonar speler ein viktig rolle i å gjera svært betrig program. Førre studiar langs denne linja fokuserte hovudsakelig på perturbasjonar i den naturlege språksspørsmålssiden, og ignorerer variabelen av tabeller. Dette er motivert, og vi foreslår Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) som ein ny attacking paradigm for å måle kraftighet av tekst- til- SQL- modeller. Etter denne første første første første uttrykk, kurrer vi ADVETA, den første uttrykk-evalueringsbenchmarken som inneheld naturlege og realistiske ATP. Alle testerte modeller for kunsten opplever dramatiske utviklingar drop på ADVETA, som viser viktig rom for forbetringar. For å forskyve mot ATP, bygger vi eit systematisk kontrateralisk opplæring for eksempel for å generera rammeverket som er tilpassa for betre kontekstualisering av tabulatordata. Eksperimentar viser at tilnærminga vårt gjer modeller beste robustforbetringa mot ATP, mens også større modellen for robusthet mot NL-side-perturbasjonar. Vi vil opna ADVETA og kode for å gjera framtidige forskning.', 'sv': 'Robustheten hos text-till-SQL-tolkare mot motstridiga störningar spelar en avgörande roll för att leverera mycket tillförlitliga program. Tidigare studier längs denna linje fokuserade främst på störningar på frågesidan med naturligt språk, bortsett från variabiliteten i tabeller. Motiverad av detta föreslår vi Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) som ett nytt angripande paradigm för att mäta robustheten hos text-till-SQL-modeller. Efter detta förslag kurerar vi ADVETA, det första riktmärket för robusthetsutvärdering med naturliga och realistiska ATP:er. Alla testade toppmoderna modeller upplever dramatiska prestandaförfall på ADVETA, vilket avslöjar betydande utrymme för förbättring. För att försvara oss mot ATP bygger vi ett systematiskt regelverk för generering av exempel på motprestationsutbildning skräddarsytt för bättre kontextualisering av tabelldata. Experiment visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt ger modellernas bästa robusthetsförbättring mot ATP, samtidigt som det avsevärt ökar modellens robusthet mot störningar på NL-sidan. Vi kommer att släppa ADVETA och kod för att underlätta framtida forskning.', 'ta': 'எதிர்பார்ப்பு குழப்பங்களுக்கு எதிராக உரையில் இருந்து SQL பார்சர்களின் தொகுப்பு மிக முக்கியமான பயன்பாடுகளை வழங்குவதில்  இந்த வரியில் முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் முதலில் இயற்கையான மொழி கேள்வி பக்கத்தில் பிரச்சனைகளை கவனம் செலுத்துகின்றன, அட்ட இதை மாற்றியமைக்கப்பட்டது, நாம் முன்னோக்கி அட்டவணை செயல்பாடு (ATP) புதிய தாக்குதல் அளபுருவாக பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இந்த பரிந்துரைக்குப் பின்னர், நாம் ADVETA புரிந்து கொடுக்கும், முதல் ஆட்பிரிப்பு மதிப்பிடும், இயற்கையான மற்றும் உண்ம All tested state-of-the-art models experience dramatic performance drops on ADVETA, revealing significant room of improvement.  ATP எதிராக பாதுகாக்க, நாங்கள் ஒரு அமைப்பு எதிர்பார்ப்பு பயிற்சி உதாரணத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மேலும் சிறந்த முறையி முயற்சிகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்றால் எம்எல் பக்கத்திற்கு எதிரான மாதிரி முன்னேற்றத்தை மாதிரியும் மாதிரிகளை மாதிரிய நாம் ADVETA மற்றும் குறியீட்டை விடுவோம் எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சியை எளிதாக்க.', 'ur': 'Text-to-SQL parsers against adversarial perturbations plays a crucial role in delivering highly reliable applications. اس لائن کے درمیان پہلے مطالعہ کی اصل میں طبیعی زبان سؤال کے سوال کے کنارے پر مغلوب کیا گیا تھا، ٹیبل کے متفاوت کو غفلت میں ڈال دیا گیا تھا. اس کے ذریعہ چلنے والی، ہم ایک نوی حملہ پارادیگ کے طور پر متن-سے-SQL موڈلوں کی طاقت کا اندازہ لینے کے لئے مخالف ٹیبل پھیرنے (ATP) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. اس پیشنهاد کے پیچھے ہم ADVETA کو دھوکا دیتے ہیں، پہلی طاقت کے ارزیابی بنچم جو طبیعی اور حقیقی ATP کو شامل کرتی ہے. تمام آزمائش کی حالت کی آزمائش کی موڈل اڈیوٹا پر ڈراماٹیکی پرورش ڈوب رہے ہیں، اور بہترین اتحادیہ کو ظاہر کرتے ہیں. ATP کے مقابلہ میں مدافع کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک سیستماتیک مخالف تدریس کی مثال کی نسل فرمود بناتے ہیں جو ٹیبلی ڈیٹی کے بہتر کنٹیکسٹولیزی کے لئے تیار کی گئی ہے. تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ الگوں کو ATP کے مقابلے میں بہترین مضبوطی کے ساتھ اچھی مضبوطی کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتا ہے، حالانکہ نیل کی طرف سے زیادہ مضبوطی کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہم اڈیوٹا اور کوڈ کو آزاد کریں گے تاکہ مستقبل تحقیق آسان کریں۔', 'uz': "Name Bu satrning oldingi o'rganishlari, asl tilning asl savollaridagi tartibiqlarni o'zgartirish, jadvalning oʻzgarishlarini saqlab qoladi. Bu narsa bilan ishga tushirilgan, biz Matn- to-SQL modellarini o'zgartirish uchun yangi harakat qilish parametrlarini anglatamiz. Bu davlatdan keyin biz ADVETAni o'rganimiz, biz asl va haqiqiqiy ATPlar bilan birinchi ko'paytirishni o'rganamiz. Hamma sinov sohalar modellari davomida tajriba bajarishni ADVETA'da ko'rib chiqaradi, o'zgarishni juda muhim xonaga ko'rsatadi. To defense against ATP, we build a systematic adversarial training example generation framework tailored for better contextualization of tabular data.  Tajribalar bu usullar ATP uchun eng yaxshi ko'plab o'xshash modellarni ko'rsatadi, ammo bu modelni ko'paytirishni o'zgartiradi. Biz kelajak qidirish uchun ADVETA va kodi chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Sự vững chắc của các phân tích Văn bản đến SQL chống đối đối đối đối tác bất động đối thủ đóng vai trò rất quan trọng trong việc cung cấp ứng dụng đáng tin cậy. Những nghiên cứu trước hướng này chủ yếu tập trung vào ô nhiễm trong mặt vấn đề ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, bỏ qua sự thay đổi của các biểu đồ. Động cơ này, chúng tôi đề nghị kết quả làm bảng chờ đợi làm gián đoạn (ATP) như một biểu tượng tấn công mới nhằm đo độ bền vững của mô hình văn bản đến SQL. Theo đề xuất này, chúng tôi quản lí ADVETA, tiêu chuẩn đánh giá độ bền vững đầu tiên với các ATP tự nhiên và thực tế. Tất cả các mô hình được thử nghiệm đều trải qua màn trình diễn bi thảm trên ADVETA, tiết lộ một khoảng tiến bộ quan trọng. Để chống lại ATP, chúng ta sẽ xây dựng một hình thức huấn luyện chuyên nghiệp chống đối nhau, nhằm mục đích tình hình tốt hơn. Thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta mang đến phương pháp nâng cao độ bền vững nhất chống lại ATP, cũng như nâng cao sức bền của mô-đun chống ô nhiễm người dân. Chúng tôi sẽ phát tán ADVETA và mã để hỗ trợ nghiên cứu tương lai.', 'da': "Robustheden af tekst-til-SQL parsere mod modstridende forstyrrelser spiller en afgørende rolle i levering af yderst pålidelige applikationer. Tidligere undersøgelser langs denne linje fokuserede primært på forstyrrelser i spørgsmålssiden med natursprog, idet man forsømte variabiliteten i tabeller. Motiveret af dette foreslår vi Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) som et nyt angribende paradigme til at måle robustheden af tekst-til-SQL modeller. Efter dette forslag kuraterer vi ADVETA, det første robusthedsvurderingsbenchmark med naturlige og realistiske ATP'er. Alle testede state-of-the-art modeller oplever dramatiske præstationsfald på ADVETA, hvilket afslører betydelige muligheder for forbedring. Til forsvar mod ATP bygger vi en systematisk adversial træning eksempel generation ramme skræddersyet til bedre kontekstualisering af tabeldata. Eksperimenter viser, at vores tilgang giver modellerne den bedste robusthedsforbedring mod ATP, samtidig med at de øger modellens robusthed væsentligt mod forstyrrelser på NL-siden. Vi vil frigive ADVETA og kode for at lette fremtidig forskning.", 'bg': 'Здравината на анализаторите от текст към SQL срещу съпернически смущения играе решаваща роля в предоставянето на високо надеждни приложения. Предишни проучвания в тази насока се фокусираха основно върху смущенията от въпросната страна на естествения език, пренебрегвайки променливостта на таблиците. Мотивирани от това, ние предлагаме Рекламната смущения в таблицата (АТП) като нова атакуваща парадигма за измерване на стабилността на моделите Текст-към-СВ. Следвайки това предложение, ние курираме първата база за оценка на здравината, включваща естествени и реалистични АТП. Всички тествани най-съвременни модели изпитват драматични спадове на производителността, разкриващи значителни възможности за подобрение. За да се защитим срещу АТП, ние изграждаме систематична рамка за генериране на примери за съперничество, съобразена с по-добра контекстуализация на таблични данни. Експериментите показват, че нашият подход осигурява най-доброто подобрение на здравината на моделите спрямо АТП, като същевременно значително повишава здравината на модела срещу смущения от страна на Нидерландия. Ще пуснем и код, за да улесним бъдещите изследвания.', 'nl': "De robuustheid van Text-to-SQL parsers tegen tegenstrijdige verstoringen speelt een cruciale rol bij het leveren van zeer betrouwbare applicaties. Eerdere studies in deze richting richtten zich voornamelijk op verstoringen in de vraagzijde van de natuurlijke taal, waarbij de variabiliteit van tabellen werd verwaarloosd. Daarom stellen we de Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) voor als nieuw aanvalsparadigma om de robuustheid van Text-to-SQL modellen te meten. Naar aanleiding van deze propositie cureren we ADVETA, de eerste robuustheidsevaluatie benchmark met natuurlijke en realistische ATP's. Alle geteste state-of-the-art modellen ervaren dramatische prestatiedalingen op ADVETA, wat aanzienlijke verbeterruimte onthult. Ter verdediging tegen ATP, bouwen we een systematisch adversariaal training voorbeeldgeneratie framework op maat voor een betere contextualisering van tabelgegevens. Experimenten tonen aan dat onze aanpak modellen de beste robuustheidsverbetering biedt tegen ATP, terwijl ze ook de robuustheid van modellen tegen storingen aan NL-zijde aanzienlijk verhogen. We zullen ADVETA en code vrijgeven om toekomstig onderzoek te vergemakkelijken.", 'de': 'Die Robustheit von Text-to-SQL Parsern gegen gegensätzliche Störungen spielt eine entscheidende Rolle bei der Bereitstellung hochzuverlässiger Anwendungen. Frühere Studien in dieser Richtung konzentrierten sich hauptsächlich auf Störungen in der Fragenseite der natürlichen Sprache, wobei die Variabilität der Tabellen vernachlässigt wurde. Aus diesem Grund schlagen wir die Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) als neues Angriffsparadigma vor, um die Robustheit von Text-to-SQL Modellen zu messen. Diesem Vorschlag folgend, kuratieren wir ADVETA, den ersten Robustheit-Bewertungsbenchmark mit natürlichen und realistischen ATPs. Alle getesteten State-of-the-Art-Modelle erleben dramatische Leistungseinbrüche bei ADVETA, was erhebliche Verbesserungspotenziale aufzeigt. Zur Abwehr von ATP bauen wir ein systematisches Framework zur Generierung von Trainingsbeispielen auf, das auf eine bessere Kontextualisierung von tabellarischen Daten zugeschnitten ist. Experimente zeigen, dass unser Ansatz Modelle die beste Robustheitsverbesserung gegenüber ATP bringt und gleichzeitig die Robustheit gegenüber NL-seitigen Störungen erheblich erhöht. Wir werden ADVETA und Code veröffentlichen, um zukünftige Forschung zu erleichtern.', 'hr': 'Snaganje analizatora teksta do SQL-a protiv neprijateljskih perturbacija igra ključnu ulogu u ispunjavanju vrlo pouzdanih primjena. Prethodna ispitivanja duž te linije uglavnom se fokusirala na perturbacije na prirodnoj strani pitanja jezika, zaboravljajući variabilnost tablica. Pod motivacijom toga, predlažemo prosvjetiteljsku tablu Perturbaciju (ATP) kao novu paradigmu napada kako bi mjerili robotu modela teksta do SQL-a. Nakon ovog prijedloga, uključili smo ADVETA, prvu mjerenicu za procjenu robotnosti koja uključuje prirodne i realne ATP-e. Svi testirani modeli stanja umjetnosti iskusili su dramatične uspjehe na ADVETA-u, otkrivajući značajnu sobu poboljšanja. Za obranu protiv ATP-a, izgradili smo sistematski okvir neprijateljskog treninga, koji je prilagođen za bolju kontekstualizaciju tabularnih podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš pristup donosi najbolje poboljšanje mogućnosti modela protiv ATP-a, dok također značajno povećava model jačinu protiv perturbacija na NL strani. Pustit ćemo ADVETA i šifru kako bi olakšali buduće istraživanje.', 'ko': '텍스트를 SQL 해석기에 연결하는 것은 적의 방해에 대한 루바성은 매우 신뢰할 수 있는 응용 프로그램을 납품하는 데 중요한 역할을 한다.이전의 연구는 주로 자연 언어 문제의 교란에 집중되어 표의 가변성을 소홀히 했다.이를 바탕으로 우리는 대항표 교란(ATP)을 새로운 공격 모델로 삼아 텍스트부터 SQL 모델까지의 노봉성을 평가했다.이런 주장에 따라 자연과 현실의 ATP를 특징으로 한 최초의 안정성 평가 기준인 ADVETA를 기획했다.테스트를 거친 모든 최첨단 모델은 ADVETA에서의 성능이 대폭 하락하여 현저한 개선 공간을 보였다.ATP를 방어하기 위해 우리는 체계적인 대항성 훈련 예시 생성 프레임워크를 구축했는데 이 프레임워크는 표 데이터를 더욱 잘 상황화하는 데 사용된다.실험에 의하면 우리의 방법은 모델이 ATP에 대한 노봉성을 최대한 높였고 모델이 NL 측에 교란하는 노봉성을 현저히 높였다.우리는 ADVETA와 코드를 발표하여 미래의 연구를 추진할 것이다.', 'id': 'Kekuatan parser teks-ke-SQL melawan gangguan musuh bermain peran penting dalam menyediakan aplikasi yang sangat dipercaya. Studi sebelumnya sepanjang garis ini terutama fokus pada perturbasi di sisi pertanyaan bahasa alami, mengabaikan variabilitas tabel. Motivated by this, we propose the Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) as a new attacking paradigm to measure robustness of Text-to-SQL models. Setelah proposisi ini, kami mengurus ADVETA, benchmark evaluasi ketakutan pertama yang mengandung ATP alami dan realistis. Semua model terbaik yang diuji mengalami prestasi dramatis jatuh pada ADVETA, mengungkapkan ruang yang signifikan penambahan. Untuk mempertahankan ATP, kami membangun sistem latihan musuh contoh generasi cadangan yang disesuaikan untuk kontekstualisasi lebih baik dari data tabular. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita membawa model yang terbaik kebaikan terhadap ATP, sementara juga meningkatkan kebaikan model terhadap perturbasi sisi NL. Kita akan melepaskan ADVETA dan kode untuk memudahkan penelitian masa depan.', 'fa': 'استعداد متن به SQL در مقابل تغییرات دشمنی نقش بسیار مهم در تحویل کاربردهای بسیار قابل اطمینان بازی می کند. مطالعات قبلی در طول این خط اصلاً روی تغییرات در طرف سوال زبان طبیعی تمرکز می\u200cشود، و تغییرات میز را نادیده می\u200cدهد. به وسیله این حرکت می\u200cکنیم، ما پیشنهاد میز مخالفت (ATP) را به عنوان پارادیگ حمله جدید برای اندازه\u200cگیری قوی از مدل\u200cهای متن به SQL پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. بعد از این پیشنهاد، ما ADVETA را حل می\u200cکنیم، اولین مقدار ارزیابی قوی که توسط ATP طبیعی و واقعی است. تمام مدل\u200cهای موقعیت هنری آزمایش شده\u200cاند، تجربه\u200cهای عملکرد دراماتیکی روی ADVETA فرود می\u200cرود، و اتاق بزرگی بهترین را نشان می\u200cدهد. برای دفاع از ATP، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که دستور ما بهترین توسعه\u200cهای استواری در مقابل ATP را به مدل می\u200cآورد، در حالی که همچنین مدل استواری در مقابل توسعه\u200cهای NL را بیشتر می\u200cدهد. ما ADVETA و کد را آزاد می کنیم تا تحقیقات آینده را آسان کنیم.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na wabunge wa Mataifa na SQL dhidi ya uvunjifu wa upinzani unafanya jukumu la muhimu katika kutoa matumizi yanayoaminika sana. Tafiti zilizopita katika mstari huu hasa zilikuwa zinajikita kwenye mabadiliko katika upande wa maswali ya asili ya lugha, wakipuuza mabadiliko ya meza. Hatua hii, tunapendekeza Udhibiti wa Mifuko ya Kimataifa (ATP) kama upande mpya wa shambulio ili kupima nguo za mifano ya Kimataifa ya SQL. Kufuatia pendekezo hili, tunafundisha ADVETA, tafiti ya kwanza ya uchunguzi wa ubunifu unaoonyesha ATPs asilia na halisi. Vyombo vyote vilivyojaribiwa na mifano ya sanaa vinaonekana kupungua kwa ufanisi mkubwa kwenye ADVETA, na kuonyesha chumba kikubwa cha maboresho. Ili kulinda dhidi ya ATP, tunajenga mifano ya mafunzo ya mfumo wa upinzani wa mfumo wa mifano ya utoaji wa mafunzo yanayopingwa kwa ajili ya kutangaza zaidi taarifa za tabia. Majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inaleta mifano bora ya uboreshaji wa ubunifu dhidi ya ATP, wakati pia inaongeza ubora wa muundo dhidi ya uvunjifu wa NL. Tutawaacha ADVETA na sheria ili kusaidia utafiti wa baadaye.', 'af': "Die kragtigheid van Teks- na- SQL-verwerkers teen teenstandaarlike perturbasies speel 'n kruipende rol in die laai van baie vertroubare toepassings. Vorige studie langs hierdie lyn voorskynlik gefokus is op perturbasies in die natuurlike taal vraag kant, verwerking van die veranderbaarheid van tabelle. Gemotiveerde deur hierdie, voorstel ons die Adversarial Tabel Perturbation (ATP) as 'n nuwe atake paradigm om kragtigheid van Teks-na-SQL modele te maak. Volgens hierdie voorstel het ons ADVETA, die eerste kragtige evalueringsbenchmark wat natuurlike en realistiese ATP opgesluit. Alle testeerde state-of-the-art modele erfaring dramatiese prestasie val op ADVETA, wat betekende kamer van verbetering vertoon word. Om te beskerm teen ATP, bou ons 'n sistematiese teëstandaarlike onderwerking voorbeeld van generasie raamwerk wat vir beter konteksualisering van tabulêre data gegryp is. Eksperimente wys dat ons toegang model beste kragtigheid verbetering teen ATP bring, terwyl ook substantieel versterk model kragtigheid teen NL-kant perturbasies. Ons sal ADVETA en kode verlos om toekomstige ondersoek te maak.", 'sq': 'Rëndshmëria e analizuesve Tekst-në-SQL kundër shqetësimeve kundërshtare luan një rol vendimtar në dhënien e aplikimeve shumë të besueshme. Studimet e mëparshme gjatë kësaj linje u përqëndruan kryesisht në shqetësimet në anën e pyetjeve të gjuhës natyrore, duke harruar variabilitetin e tabelave. Motivuar nga kjo, ne propozojmë Perturbimin e Tabelës kundërshtare (ATP) si një paradigm ë të re sulmuese për të matur fuqinë e modeleve Text-to-SQL. Pas kësaj propozimi, ne kurojmë ADVETA, pika e parë e vlerësimit të robustësisë me ATP natyrore dhe realiste. Të gjitha modelet e testuara të moderne përjetojnë rënie dramatike në ADVETA, duke zbuluar dhomë të rëndësishme përmirësimi. Për të mbrojtur kundër ATP, ne ndërtojmë një sistem trajnimi kundërshtar shembull të gjenerimit kuadri të përshtatur për kontekstualizim më të mirë të të dhënave tabulare. Experiments show that our approach brings models best robustness improvement against ATP, while also substantially boost model robustness against NL-side perturbations.  Do të lëshojmë ADVETA dhe kodin për të lehtësuar kërkimin e ardhshëm.', 'tr': "Tekst-we-SQL parsarlaryň teňkili faýllary baglanyşykda örän güýçli uygulamalaryny ýetirmekde has nähili nähili oýnap otyr. Öňki öňki öňki öwrenmeler bu hatyň içinde tebigy dil soragynda üýtgeşmeleri barada üns berdi. Öň tarapyndan görkezilişi, biz Adversarial Täblisaň Perturbasyon (ATP) täze bir golaý paradigmanyň üstünligini metin-tä-SQL nusgalaryny ölçürmek üçin teklip edeni teklip berýäris. Bu teklifinin ardından, ADVETA'yı kurtaracağız, ilk güçlü değerlendirme takımı doğal ve gerçek ATP'leri featirleyen noktaları. Hemme testi edilen sanat nusgalarynyň ADVETA'da dramatik ukyplary tapyp barýar, gowurak otagyny görkezilýär. ATP'a garşy etmek üçin sistematik teňkil umyt etmek üçin, täblik maglumatlaryň gowy synplanlaşdyrylmagy üçin sistematik teňkil umytlaryň çerçevesini inşa edýäris. Denminatlar biziň metodamyzyň ATP'a garşy nusgalaryň iň gowy ýigyrlygyny getirip barýandygyny görkezýär, hem NL tarapynyň turbasyna garşy nusgasyny örän ýigyrlygyny üýtgedýär. Biz ADVETA we ködlerni gelejekki araştyrmalary aňsat etmek üçin boşadyryn.", 'hy': 'Տեքստ-ՍQL-ի վերլուծումների ուժեղությունը հակառակ խռովումների դեմ կարևոր դեր է խաղում շատ վստահելի ծրագրերի կատարման մեջ: Այս ուղղությամբ նախորդ ուսումնասիրությունները հիմնականում կենտրոնացել են բնական լեզվի հարցի կողմում, անտեսելով աղյուսակների տարբերակությունը: Սրա միջոցով մենք առաջարկում ենք հակառակ սեղանի պրոտուրբիան (ATP) որպես նոր հարձակման պարադիգմ, որը կչափի տեքստի-SQL մոդելների ուժեղությունը: Այս առաջարկության հետևանքով մենք կազմակերպում ենք ԱԴՎԵՏԱ-ը, առաջին ուժեղության գնահատման համեմատային նպատակը, որը ներառում է բնական և իրական ATP-ներ: Բոլոր փորձարկված ամենաբարձր մոդելները զգում են ԱԴՎԵՏԱ-ի դրամատիկ արտադրողականության նվազում, բացահայտելով նշանակալի բարելավման սենյակ: ԱԹՊ-ի դեմ պաշտպանելու համար մենք ստեղծում ենք սիստեմատիկ հակառակորդական վարժեցման օրինակ սերնդի շրջանակներ, որոնք պատրաստված են լավագույն կոնտեքստիալիզացիայի համար աղյուսակների տվյալները: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը առաջացնում է մոդելների լավագույն հաստատությունը ATP-ի դեմ, միաժամանակ նաև նշանակալիորեն բարձրացնում է մոդելների հաստատությունը ՆԼ-ի կողմնակի շեղումների դեմ: Մենք կհրապարակենք ADVՏԱ-ը և կոդը, որպեսզի հեշտացնենք ապագա հետազոտությունը:', 'az': 'Metin-to-SQL analizacıların düşmənçilik perturbasyonuna qarşı güclülük çox güvenilir proqramları təyin etmək üçün çox möhkəm rol oynayır. Bu sətir boyunca əvvəlki öyrənmələr təbiətli dil suallarının sorğu tərəfində perturbasyonlara odaqlanır, masaların dəyişikliklərini unutmayırlar. Bunun dəyişdirilməsində, biz "Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP)" mətn-to-SQL modellerinin güclüyünü ölçürmək üçün yeni saldırma paradigmi olaraq təklif edirik. Bu təbliğdən sonra, ADVETA\'nın ilk güclülük değerlendirməsi təbiətli və reālistik ATP-lərini göstərən ilk dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərini çəkirik. Tüm sınaqların təcrübəsi modelləri ADVETA-ya dramatik performans düşəcək və böyük düzəltmə odasını göstərirlər. ATP ilə müdafiə etmək üçün sistematik düşmənçilik təhsil məsələlərini daha yaxşı təhsil etmək üçün düzəldilən sistematik təhsil məsələlərini inşa edirik. İşləşmələr bizim metodlarımız ATP qarşısında ən güclü modelləri daha yaxşılaşdırmağımızı göstərir, həmçinin də NL tərəflərinin müxtəlif sıxıntılarını daha çox artırar. Biz ADVETA və kodu gələcək araştırmaları asanlaşdırmaq üçün yayınlayacağıq.', 'bs': 'Snaganje analizatora teksta do SQL-a protiv neprijateljskih perturbacija igra ključnu ulogu u donošenju visoko pouzdanih aplikacija. Prethodna ispitivanja duž te linije uglavnom se fokusirala na perturbacije na prirodnoj strani pitanja jezika, zaboravljajući variabilnost stolova. Pod motivacijom ovoga, predlažemo prosvjetiteljsku tablu Perturbaciju (ATP) kao novu paradigmu napada kako bi mjerili robustnost modela teksta do SQL-a. Nakon ovog prijedloga, uključili smo ADVETA, prvu mjerenicu za procjenu robotnosti koja uključuje prirodne i realne ATP-e. Svi testirani modeli stanja umjetnosti iskuse dramatične funkcije padaju na ADVETA, otkrivajući značajnu sobu poboljšanja. Da bi se obranili protiv ATP, izgradili smo sistematski okvir proizvodnje neprijateljskog treninga koji je prilagođen za bolju kontekstualizaciju tabularnih podataka. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš pristup donosi modele najbolje poboljšanje robote protiv ATP-a, a također značajno povećava model robote protiv perturbacija na NL-u. Pustit ćemo ADVETA i kodiranje kako bi olakšali buduće istraživanje.', 'bn': 'বিরোধী বিপর্যয়ের বিরুদ্ধে টেক্সট থেকে এসকিউএল পার্সারের ধারণা অত্যন্ত বিশ্বস্ত অ্যাপলিকেশন প্রদান করার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর এই লাইনের পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণাগুলো প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রশ্নের পাশে বিভ্রান্ত বিভ্রান্তির উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে, টেবি এই ব্যাপারে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি প্রধান টেবিল পার্টারেশন (ATP) যাতে টেক্সট থেকে SQL মডেলের রাস্তার পরিমাপ পরিমাপের জন্য নতুন আক্রমণের প্ এই প্রস্তাব অনুসরণ করে আমরা এডভেটাকে প্রথম রাস্তা বেঞ্চ মূল্যায়ন করি, যা প্রাকৃতিক এবং বাস্তবতার ATPকে প্রদান করে। সব পরীক্ষা করা রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প মডেলের অভিজ্ঞতা এডভেটার উপর ন্যায়াতন্ত্র প্রদর্শনের অভিজ্ঞতা কমে যাচ্ছে, যা উন্নয়নের বি এটপির বিরুদ্ধে প্রতিরক্ষা করার জন্য আমরা একটি সিস্টেমিক বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণের উদাহরণ তৈরি করি যা ট্যাবুলেল ডাটা প্রতিযোগিত Experiments show that our approach brings models best robustness improvement against ATP, while also substantially boost model robustness against NL-side perturbations.  ভবিষ্যতের গবেষণায় আমরা এডভেটা এবং কোড মুক্তি দেব।', 'ca': "La robustet dels analitzadors de text a SQL contra les perturbacions adversaries té un paper crucial en la prestació d'aplicacions altament fiables. Els estudis anteriors en aquesta línia van centrar-se principalment en les perturbacions de la part de la pregunta de la llengua natural, ignorant la variabilitat de les taules. Motivada per això, proposem la Perturbació de la Tabla Adversària (ATP) com un nou paradigm a atacant per mesurar la robustet dels models de text a SQL. Following this proposition, we curate ADVETA, the first robustness evaluation benchmark featuring natural and realistic ATPs.  Tots els models d'última tecnologia testats experimenten una disminució dramàtica del rendiment en ADVETA, revelant un espai significatiu d'millora. Per a defensar-nos contra ATP, construim un marc sistemàtic de formació adversaria per a generar exemples adaptat a una millor contextualització de les dades tabulars. Els experiments demostren que el nostre enfocament porta millor models de robustet en comparació amb l'ATP, alhora que també augmenta substancialment la robustet del model en comparació amb les perturbacions de la part de NL. Liberarem ADVETA i codi per facilitar la recerca futura.", 'cs': 'Robustnost Text-to-SQL parserů proti nepřátelským poruchám hraje klíčovou roli při poskytování vysoce spolehlivých aplikací. Předchozí studie podle tohoto směru se zaměřovaly především na poruchy v otázkové straně přirozeného jazyka, zanedbávající variabilitu tabulek. Na základě toho navrhujeme nepříznivou tabulku Perturbaci (ATP) jako nové útočné paradigma pro měření robustnosti Text-to-SQL modelů. Na základě tohoto návrhu vytváříme ADVETA, první benchmark hodnocení robustnosti s přirozenými a realistickými ATP. Všechny testované nejmodernější modely zaznamenají dramatické poklesy výkonu na ADVETA, což odhaluje značný prostor zlepšení. K obraně proti ATP vytvoříme systematický rámec pro generování příkladů příkladů šitý na míru pro lepší kontextualizaci tabulkových dat. Experimenty ukazují, že náš přístup přináší modelům nejlepší zlepšení robustnosti proti ATP a zároveň výrazně zvyšuje robustnost modelu proti poruchám NL. Vydáme ADVETA a kód pro usnadnění budoucího výzkumu.', 'et': 'Text-to-SQL parserite tugevus vastaste häirete vastu mängib väga usaldusväärsete rakenduste pakkumisel otsustavat rolli. Eelmised uuringud keskendusid eelkõige looduskeele küsimuse küsimuse küsimuses esinevatele häiretele, jättes tähelepanuta tabelite varieeruvust. Selle põhjal pakume välja Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) kui uus ründav paradigma Text-to-SQL mudelite tugevuse mõõtmiseks. Selle ettepaneku järgi kureerime ADVETA, esimese vastupidavuse hindamise võrdlusaluse, mis sisaldab looduslikke ja realistlikke ATP-sid. Kõik testitud tipptasemel mudelid kogevad ADVETA jõudluse dramaatilist langust, mis näitab märkimisväärset arenguruumi. ATP vastu kaitsmiseks ehitame süstemaatilise vastase koolituse näidete genereerimise raamistiku, mis on kohandatud tabeliandmete paremaks kontekstualiseerimiseks. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis parandab mudelite vastupidavust ATP-ga võrreldes, suurendades samas oluliselt mudeli vastupidavust NL-poolsete häirete vastu. Vabastame ADVETA ja koodi, et hõlbustada tulevasi uuringuid.', 'fi': 'Teksti-SQL-parserien kestävyys vastakkaisia häiriöitä vastaan on ratkaisevassa asemassa erittäin luotettavien sovellusten toimittamisessa. Aiemmissa tämän suuntaisissa tutkimuksissa keskityttiin ensisijaisesti luonnonkielen kysymyspuolen häiriöihin unohtamatta taulukoiden vaihtelua. Tämän pohjalta ehdotamme Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) uutta hyökkäysparadigmaa Text-to-SQL-mallien kestävyyden mittaamiseksi. Tämän ehdotuksen mukaisesti kuratoimme ADVETA, joka on ensimmäinen kestävyyden arviointibenchmark, jossa on luonnollisia ja realistisia ATP-yhdisteitä. Kaikki testatut huipputekniset mallit kokevat ADVETA:n suorituskyvyn dramaattisia laskuja, mikä paljastaa merkittäviä parannusmahdollisuuksia. ATP:tä vastaan suojautumiseksi rakennamme systemaattisen vastustajakoulutuksen esimerkkien generointikehyksen, joka on räätälöity taulukkotietojen kontekstualisointiin. Kokeet osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme parantaa mallien kestävyyttä ATP:tä vastaan ja parantaa merkittävästi mallien kestävyyttä NL-puolen häiriöitä vastaan. Julkaisemme ADVETA:n ja koodin helpottaaksemme tulevaa tutkimusta.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ-ወደ-SQL ፓርላር ላይ በተቃዋሚ ተቃውሞ የሚቃወሙ የጽሑፍ አቀማመጥ እጅግ የታመነ ፕሮግራሞች በመስጠት የሚያስፈልገውን አስቸጋሪ ክፍል ያደርጋል፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት በዚህ መስመር ላይ በተለየ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ጥያቄ በመጠቀም ላይ ተቃውሞ ነው፡፡ Motivated by this, we propose the Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) as a new attacking paradigm to measure robustness of Text-to-SQL models.  ይህንን አዲስ ጥያቄ ከተከተለ፣ የፊተኛውን የንፍቅና የፍጥረት እና የአፍሪካ እና የአፍሪካዊ አቴፕ በሚያሳየው የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት አዲስ ማስታወቂያውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የዓላማ ሥርዓት ሙሉ ተፈትኖ ሁሉ የድምፅ ውጤት በADVETA ላይ የሚያሳውቅ ትልቅ ስፍራን የሚያሳውቅ ነው፡፡ To defense against ATP, we build a systematic adversarial training example generation framework tailored for better contextualization of tabular data.  ፈተናዎች የእኛ መግለጫ በኤቲፕ ላይ የበለጠ የልብስ አካባቢ ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ምርመራ ለማግኘት ADVETA እና ኮድ እናወጣለን፡፡', 'jv': 'Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog Laptop" and "Desktop Motyabat karo iki, kita supoyo Advertorial table Pertruation (ATP) nganggo tresnani alam sing dibenakake nggambar apakno nggambar apakno model Text-to-sqL. layers-action Name Ngubah-Ngerawat karo ATP kuwi, kita nguasai sistematik pakan-tanggal kuwi wis nguasai perusahaan dumadhi kapan kuwi tindakan data yang cukup. Gejer ujogno ngomong nik akeh model sing nyebute nggawe akeh nguasar tentang karo ATP, sampeyan ngono akeh supaya model sing gawe barang nggawe barang NL-side perbagurasi. Awak dhéwé bakal ngembukaké DEVE lan kode kanggo ngejaraké surat kapun.', 'ha': "Rutsurin parser na Text-to-SQL don a yi motsi ga turbatori masu motsi, yana da wani muhimu roli a samar da shiryoyin ayuka masu amintarwa. @ action: button Aka motsa daga wannan, Muke goyyar da Perturbation na Janel na Adversarial (ATP) kamar wata paradigm na bakwai shawarar da za'a ƙayyade tufãfin-na-SQL. Ga bayan wannan da aka faɗa, za'a karatun ADADADADTA, an ƙaddara na farkon makaranta da littãfin da ke samu da mataimaki. Dukan jarraba halin-mai-sanawa na samu'ar da za'a sami da sauri mai sauri ga ADADADADTA, kuma ya bayyana wuri mai girma ga gyarata. Ina iya tsare wa ATP, za mu samar da wani misãlan mai motsi na ƙidãya mai tsaro na kasancẽwa wanda aka taimaki zuwa mafi kyaun taƙaita data na tabar. Tajarakin na nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana zo da misalin mafiya kyakkyawan tufe a kan ATP, kuma kuma yana ƙara kiyayen tufãfin motsi a kan batarin-side na NL. Za sakar da ADeveTA da kode don mu yi sauƙin amfani da littafin nan gaba.", 'sk': 'Robustnost razčlenjevalnikov Text-to-SQL proti kontrastnim motnjam igra ključno vlogo pri zagotavljanju zelo zanesljivih aplikacij. Prejšnje študije v tej smeri so se osredotočale predvsem na motnje v naravnem jeziku, pri čemer so zanemarile variabilnost tabel. Na podlagi tega predlagamo motnje oglasnih tabel (ATP) kot novo napadalno paradigmo za merjenje robustnosti modelov Text-to-SQL. Na podlagi tega predloga izdelamo ADVETA, prvo merilo za ocenjevanje robustnosti z naravnimi in realističnimi ATP-ji. Vsi preizkušeni najsodobnejši modeli doživljajo dramatično zmanjšanje zmogljivosti pri ADVETA, kar razkriva znatne možnosti za izboljšave. Za obrambo proti ATP izdelujemo sistematično kontradiktorsko usposabljanje primerov, prilagojeno za boljšo kontekstualizacijo tabelarnih podatkov. Poskusi kažejo, da naš pristop prinaša najboljše izboljšanje robustnosti modelov v primerjavi z ATP, hkrati pa bistveno poveča robustnost modelov v primerjavi z motnjami na strani NL. Izdali bomo ADVETA in kodo za olajšanje prihodnjih raziskav.', 'he': 'החזקה של מחקרי טקסט-ל-SQL נגד הפרעות יריביות משחקת תפקיד קריטי בהעברת שימושים אמינים מאוד. Previous studies along this line primarily focused on perturbations in the natural language question side, neglecting the variability of tables.  מוטיבציה על ידי זה, אנו מציעים את הפרעת שולחן ההתנגדות (ATP) כפרדיגמה מתקפת חדשה כדי למדוד חזקה של דוגמנים טקסט-ל-SQL. לאחר ההצעה הזו, אנו מפעילים את ADVETA, המרמז הראשון של הערכת החזקה המכיל ATPs טבעיים ומציאותיים. כל הדוגמנים המבוחנים ביותר חווים טיפות ביצועים דרמטיות על ADVETA, לחשוף חדר משמעותי של שיפור. כדי להגן נגד ATP, אנחנו בונים דוגמא אימון יריבי שיטתי סגרת דוגמא דור מתוכננת לקונטליזציה טובה יותר של נתונים טבלונים. ניסויים מראים שהגישה שלנו מביאה דוגמנים שיפור חזקה הטוב ביותר נגד ATP, בעוד גם מגביר חזקה משמעותית מודל נגד הפרעות בצד NL. אנחנו נשחרר ADVETA וקוד כדי להקל מחקר עתיד.', 'bo': 'The robustness of Text-to-SQL parsers against adversarial perturbations plays a crucial role in delivering highly reliable applications. སྔོན་ལྟའི་བརྡ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐོང་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པར་མཐོང་ཚད་དང་། Motivated by this, we propose the Adversarial Table Perturbation (ATP) as a new attacking paradigm to measure robustness of Text-to-SQL models. འོག་གི་བསམ་འཆར་བརྗོད་ནས་ ང་ཚོས་ADVETA་དང་། robustness evaluation benchmark གཙོ་ཅན་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དང་ དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ATPs ཞིག་དག་གི་ཡོད། ADVETA་ནང་གི་སྟོབས་ཤུགས་གཙོ་བ་ཁག་ཅིག ATP ལ་ཉེན་བྱ་བརྗོད་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྐྱེན་གྱི་དཔེར་ན། Experiments show that our approach brings models best robustness improvement against ATP, while also substantially boost model robustness against NL-side perturbations. ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་པར་ཞིབ་བཤེར་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་པར་ ADVETA་དང་ཨང་ཀིའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': '', 'ar': 'التغلب على النسيان الكارثي وراء التعلم المستمر: تدريب متوازن للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'fr': "Surmonter l'oubli catastrophique au-delà de l'apprentissage continu\xa0: formation équilibrée pour la traduction automatique neuronale", 'es': 'Superar el olvido catastrófico más allá del aprendizaje continuo: entrenamiento equilibrado para la traducción automática neuronal', 'pt': 'Superando o esquecimento catastrófico além do aprendizado contínuo: treinamento equilibrado para tradução automática neural', 'ja': '継続的な学習を超えた破滅的な忘却の克服：神経機械翻訳のためのバランスの取れたトレーニング', 'hi': 'निरंतर सीखने से परे विनाशकारी भूल पर काबू पाने: तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए संतुलित प्रशिक्षण', 'zh': '克越之灾难性忘:神经机器译之平', 'ru': 'Преодоление катастрофического забывания за рамками непрерывного обучения: сбалансированное обучение нейронному машинному переводу', 'ga': "Tubaiste a Shárú Dearmad a Dhéanamh thar Fhoghlaim Leanúnach: Oiliúint Chothrom d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarthach", 'hu': 'A folyamatos tanuláson túli katasztrofális felejtés leküzdése: kiegyensúlyozott képzés a neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Υπερνίκηση της καταστροφικής λησμονής πέρα από τη συνεχή μάθηση: Ισορροπημένη εκπαίδευση για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'ka': 'კატატრატური გადავიწყება შემდეგ გადასწავლება: ბალანსური განაწყება ნეიროლური მაქინის გადასწავლებისთვის', 'it': "Superare il dimenticatoio catastrofico oltre l'apprendimento continuo: formazione equilibrata per la traduzione automatica neurale", 'lt': 'Overcoming Catastrophic Forgetting beyond Continual Learning: Balanced Training for Neural Machine Translation', 'ms': 'Melewati Lupakan Katastrofik Melewati Belajar Terus: Latihan Berseimbang untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'kk': 'Жалғастырмалы оқу артығынан тыс қаттастрофиялық ұмытылу: Нейрондық машинаның аудармасының балансиялық оқу', 'mk': 'Преминување на катастрофалното заборавување надвор од континуалното учење: балансирана обука за преведување на неврални машини', 'ml': 'തുടര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പഠനത്തിനു മുമ്പില്\u200d വരുന്ന കഷ്ട്രോഫിക്ക് മറക്കുന്നത്: നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ', 'mt': 'Il-ġlieda kontra t-Tagħlim Katastrofiku lil hinn mit-Tagħlim Kontinwu: Taħriġ ibbilanċjat għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali', 'no': 'Overkommende katastrofisk glemmer bort kontinuell læring: Balansert læring for neuralmaskineoversettelse', 'mn': 'Үүнээс үргэлжлүүлэх сургалтын дараа гамшигтай гамшигтай байдлыг мартах: Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машин хөгжлийн балансийн сургалт', 'pl': 'Przezwyciężenie katastroficznego zapomnienia poza ciągłym uczeniem się: zrównoważone szkolenie w zakresie neuronalnego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Depășirea uitării catastrofale dincolo de învățarea continuă: formare echilibrată pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'sr': 'Prevladavajući katastrofski zaboravljanje izvan kontinualnog učenja: Balancirana obuka za neurološki prevod mašine', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් අමතක වෙලා ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් අමතක වෙනවා: සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපකය සඳහා සාමාන්ය විද', 'sv': 'Att övervinna katastrofisk glömska bortom fortlöpande lärande: balanserad utbildning för neural maskinöversättning', 'so': 'Waxbarashada sii socda', 'ta': 'தொடர்ந்து கற்றுக்கு மேல் வரும் பாதிப்பு மறக்கப்படுகிறது: நெயுரல் இயந்திரத்திற்கான மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான நில', 'ur': 'نائرل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے برابر تطالب کیا گیا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Vượt qua nỗi khổ thực vượt qua học liên tiếp', 'hr': 'Prevladavajući katastrofski zaboravljanje izvan kontinualnog učenja: Balancirana obuka za neurološki prevod strojeva', 'bg': 'Преодоляване на катастрофалната забрава отвъд непрекъснатото учене: балансирано обучение за неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Catastrofisch vergeten overwinnen voorbij continu leren: gebalanceerde training voor neurale machinevertaling', 'da': 'Overvinde katastrofal glemme ud over kontinuerlig læring: Afbalanceret træning til neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Katastrophales Vergessen jenseits des kontinuierlichen Lernens überwinden: Ausgewogenes Training für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Mengatasi Lupakan Katastrofik Selain Belajar Terus: Pelatihan Balanced untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'ko': '지속적인 학습 이외의 재난적 망각 극복: 신경기계 번역의 균형 훈련', 'tr': '횜wrenmek 체챌in 첵eterlik Katastrofi첵asy 첵atdan 챌ykaryp bilen dowam ed첵채r: Neural Makina 횉evirmesi 체챌in Balansy Tren', 'fa': 'فراتر از یادگیری دائمی فراموش می\u200cکند: آموزش تعادل برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'sq': 'Duke kapërcyer harrimin katastrofik përtej mësimit të vazhdueshëm: trajnimi i balancuar për përkthimin e makinave nervore', 'af': 'Oorvloedig Katastropheese Vergeet buite voortdurende leer: Balanse Oefening vir Neurale Masjien Vertaling', 'hy': 'Մոռանալով անընդհատ սովորելուց դուրս գտնվող կատաստոֆիկ մոռացումը՝ նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման հավասարակշռությունը', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛y톛n Katastrofik 칐yr톛nm톛yi 칐yr톛nm톛k: N칬ral Makina 칐yr톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n Balansl캼 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'am': 'Overcoming Catastrophic Forgetting beyond Continual Learning: Balanced Training for Neural Machine Translation', 'ca': "Superar l'oblide catastròfic més enllà de l'aprenentatge continu: Formació equilibrada per a la traducció de màquines neuronales", 'bn': 'চলতে থাকা বিপর্যয়ের ভুলে যাচ্ছে: নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ব্যালেন্সেড প্রশিক্ষণ', 'cs': 'Překonání katastrofického zapomenutí mimo kontinuální učení: vyvážený výcvik pro neurální strojový překlad', 'bs': 'Prevladavajući katastrofski zaboravljanje izvan kontinualnog učenja: Balancirana obuka za neurološki prevod strojeva', 'et': 'Katastroofilise unustamise ületamine pärast pidevat õppimist: tasakaalustatud neuromasintõlke koolitus', 'sw': 'Kusahau Matangazo yanayotokea zaidi ya Ufunzi unaoendelea: Mafunzo ya Kipindi kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kiurali', 'fi': 'Jatkuvaa oppimista pidemmälle menevän katastrofisen unohduksen voittaminen: tasapainoinen koulutus neurokonekääntämiseen', 'jv': 'text', 'he': 'להתגבר על שכחות קטסטרופיות מעבר ללמוד ממשיך: אימון מאוזן לתרגום מכונות עצביות', 'sk': 'Premaganje katastrofskega pozabljanja onkraj stalnega učenja: uravnoteženo usposabljanje za strojno prevajanje nevronov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Overcoming Catastrophic Forgetting beyond Continual Learning: Balanced Training for Neural Machine Translation'}
{'en': 'Most previous methods for text data augmentation are limited to simple tasks and weak baselines. We explore data augmentation on hard tasks (i.e., few-shot natural language understanding) and strong baselines (i.e., pretrained models with over one billion parameters). Under this setting, we reproduced a large number of previous augmentation methods and found that these methods bring marginal gains at best and sometimes degrade the performance much. To address this challenge, we propose a novel data augmentation method FlipDA that jointly uses a generative model and a classifier to generate label-flipped data. Central to the idea of FlipDA is the discovery that generating label-flipped data is more crucial to the performance than generating label-preserved data. Experiments show that FlipDA achieves a good tradeoff between effectiveness and robustness—it substantially improves many tasks while not negatively affecting the others.', 'ar': 'تميل الشبكات العصبية إلى نسيان المعرفة التي تم تعلمها سابقًا تدريجيًا عند تعلم مهام متعددة بالتتابع من توزيعات البيانات الديناميكية. تسمى هذه المشكلة \\ textit {النسيان الكارثي} ، وهي تمثل تحديًا أساسيًا في التعلم المستمر للشبكات العصبية. في هذا العمل ، نلاحظ أن النسيان الكارثي لا يحدث فقط في التعلم المستمر ولكنه يؤثر أيضًا على التدريب الساكن التقليدي. تعاني الشبكات العصبية ، وخاصة نماذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية ، من النسيان الكارثي حتى لو تعلموا من مجموعة تدريب ثابتة. على وجه التحديد ، يولي النموذج النهائي اهتمامًا غير متوازن لعينات التدريب ، حيث تجذب العينات التي تم الكشف عنها مؤخرًا اهتمامًا أكبر من العينات السابقة. السبب الأساسي هو أن عينات التدريب لا تحصل على تدريب متوازن في كل تحديث نموذج ، لذلك نطلق على هذه المشكلة اسم \\ textit {تدريب غير متوازن}. للتخفيف من هذه المشكلة ، نقترح تقطير المعرفة التكميلي عبر الإنترنت (COKD) ، والذي يستخدم نماذج المعلم المحدثة ديناميكيًا والمدربة على أوامر بيانات محددة لتوفير المعرفة التكميلية بشكل متكرر لنموذج الطالب. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مهام الترجمة الآلية المتعددة أن طريقتنا تخفف بنجاح من مشكلة التدريب غير المتوازن وتحقق تحسينات كبيرة على أنظمة أساسية قوية.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones ont tendance à oublier progressivement les connaissances acquises précédemment lors de l'apprentissage séquentiel de plusieurs tâches à partir de distributions de données dynamiques. Ce problème est appelé\xa0\\ textit {oubli catastrophique}, qui est un défi fondamental dans l'apprentissage continu des réseaux de neurones. Dans ce travail, nous observons que l'oubli catastrophique ne se produit pas seulement dans l'apprentissage continu, mais affecte également l'entraînement statique traditionnel. Les réseaux de neurones, en particulier les modèles de traduction automatique neuronale, souffrent d'un oubli catastrophique même s'ils apprennent d'un ensemble d'entraînement statique. Pour être précis, le modèle final accorde une attention déséquilibrée aux échantillons d'apprentissage, où les échantillons récemment exposés attirent davantage l'attention que les échantillons précédents. La cause sous-jacente est que les échantillons d'entraînement ne bénéficient pas d'un entraînement équilibré à chaque mise à jour du modèle. Nous nommons donc ce problème\xa0\\ textit {entraînement déséquilibré}. Pour pallier ce problème, nous proposons la distillation complémentaire des connaissances en ligne (COKD), qui utilise des modèles d'enseignants mis à jour dynamiquement formés sur des ordres de données spécifiques pour fournir de manière itérative des connaissances complémentaires au modèle étudiant. Les résultats expérimentaux sur de multiples tâches de traduction automatique montrent que notre méthode permet de pallier avec succès le problème de la formation déséquilibrée et d'obtenir des améliorations substantielles par rapport aux systèmes de base solides.", 'es': 'Las redes neuronales tienden a olvidar gradualmente los conocimientos adquiridos anteriormente cuando aprenden varias tareas secuencialmente a partir de distribuciones de datos dinámicas. Este problema se llama\\ textit {olvido catastrófico}, que es un desafío fundamental en el aprendizaje continuo de las redes neuronales. En este trabajo, observamos que el olvido catastrófico no solo ocurre en el aprendizaje continuo, sino que también afecta al entrenamiento estático tradicional. Las redes neuronales, especialmente los modelos de traducción automática neuronal, sufren un olvido catastrófico incluso si aprenden de un conjunto de entrenamiento estático. Para ser específicos, el modelo final presta una atención desequilibrada a las muestras de entrenamiento, donde las muestras expuestas recientemente atraen más atención que las muestras anteriores. La causa subyacente es que las muestras de entrenamiento no reciben un entrenamiento equilibrado en cada actualización del modelo, por lo que llamamos a este problema\\ textit {entrenamiento desequilibrado}. Para aliviar este problema, proponemos la Destilación Complementaria de Conocimientos en Línea (COKD), que utiliza modelos docentes actualizados dinámicamente capacitados en pedidos de datos específicos para proporcionar de forma iterativa conocimientos complementarios al modelo del estudiante. Los resultados experimentales en múltiples tareas de traducción automática muestran que nuestro método alivia con éxito el problema de la formación desequilibrada y logra mejoras sustanciales con respecto a sistemas de base sólidos.', 'pt': 'As redes neurais tendem a esquecer gradualmente o conhecimento aprendido anteriormente ao aprender várias tarefas sequencialmente a partir de distribuições dinâmicas de dados. Esse problema é chamado de \\textit{esquecimento catastrófico}, que é um desafio fundamental no aprendizado contínuo de redes neurais. Neste trabalho, observamos que o esquecimento catastrófico não ocorre apenas no aprendizado contínuo, mas também afeta o treinamento estático tradicional. As redes neurais, especialmente os modelos de tradução automática neural, sofrem de esquecimento catastrófico, mesmo que aprendam com um conjunto de treinamento estático. Para ser específico, o modelo final presta atenção desequilibrada às amostras de treinamento, onde as amostras expostas recentemente atraem mais atenção do que as amostras anteriores. A causa subjacente é que as amostras de treinamento não recebem treinamento balanceado em cada atualização do modelo, então chamamos esse problema de \\textit{treinamento desequilibrado}. Para aliviar esse problema, propomos a Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), que usa modelos de professores atualizados dinamicamente e treinados em ordens de dados específicas para fornecer conhecimento complementar de forma iterativa ao modelo de aluno. Resultados experimentais em várias tarefas de tradução automática mostram que nosso método alivia com sucesso o problema de treinamento desequilibrado e alcança melhorias substanciais em sistemas de linha de base fortes.', 'ja': 'ニューラルネットワークは、動的データ分布から複数のタスクを順次学習する際に、以前に学習した知識を徐々に忘れがちである。 この問題は、\\ textit {壊滅的な忘却}と呼ばれ、ニューラルネットワークの継続的な学習における根本的な課題です。 この研究では、壊滅的な忘却が継続的な学習で起こるだけでなく、伝統的な静的トレーニングにも影響を与えることを観察しています。 ニューラルネットワーク、特にニューラル機械翻訳モデルは、静的トレーニングセットから学習しても、壊滅的な忘却に苦しんでいます。 具体的には、最終モデルはトレーニングサンプルに不均衡な注意を払い、ここでは最近露出したサンプルが以前のサンプルよりも注目を集めています。 根本的な原因は、トレーニングサンプルが各モデルのアップデートでバランスの取れたトレーニングを受けられないため、この問題を\\ textit {アンバランスなトレーニング}と名付けました。 この問題を軽減するために、私たちは、特定のデータ順序でトレーニングされた動的に更新された教師モデルを使用して、学習者モデルに補完的な知識を反復的に提供する、補完的オンライン知識蒸留（ COKD ）を提案します。 複数の機械翻訳タスクの実験結果は、当社の方法がアンバランスなトレーニングの問題をうまく緩和し、強力なベースラインシステムよりも大幅な改善を達成することを示しています。', 'zh': '神经网络于动数据分布中以次习数事,往往渐忘前学。 此之谓\\textit{灾难性忘},神经网络学之大经也。 于此观之,灾难性之遗忘,犹有静习。 神经网络,尤神经机器翻译模样,虽静练集中学习,受灾难性遗忘。 具体来说,终样本不平,其近者样本多于早期样本。 本乎训练样本每模更新,不得平衡,故命之曰 "textit{不平练}。 以纾其事,补在线取(COKD),用于特定数订单以迭代弟子。 数机器翻译之实验结果表明,解教不平,而对强基线统实质性改。', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका नेटवर्क धीरे-धीरे पहले से सीखे गए ज्ञान को भूल जाते हैं जब गतिशील डेटा वितरण से अनुक्रमिक रूप से कई कार्यों को सीखते हैं। इस समस्या को \\textit{catastrophic forgetting} कहा जाता है, जो तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के निरंतर सीखने में एक मौलिक चुनौती है। इस काम में, हम देखते हैं कि विनाशकारी भूल न केवल निरंतर सीखने में होती है, बल्कि पारंपरिक स्थैतिक प्रशिक्षण को भी प्रभावित करती है। तंत्रिका नेटवर्क, विशेष रूप से तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल, भयावह भूल से पीड़ित हैं, भले ही वे एक स्थिर प्रशिक्षण सेट से सीखते हों। विशिष्ट होने के लिए, अंतिम मॉडल प्रशिक्षण नमूनों पर असंतुलित ध्यान देता है, जहां हाल ही में उजागर किए गए नमूने पहले के नमूनों की तुलना में अधिक ध्यान आकर्षित करते हैं। अंतर्निहित कारण यह है कि प्रशिक्षण नमूनों को प्रत्येक मॉडल अपडेट में संतुलित प्रशिक्षण नहीं मिलता है, इसलिए हम इस समस्या को \\textit{असंतुलित प्रशिक्षण} नाम देते हैं। इस समस्या को कम करने के लिए, हम पूरक ऑनलाइन ज्ञान आसवन (COKD) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो छात्र मॉडल को पूरक ज्ञान प्रदान करने के लिए विशिष्ट डेटा आदेशों पर प्रशिक्षित गतिशील रूप से अद्यतन शिक्षक मॉडल का उपयोग करता है। कई मशीन अनुवाद कार्यों पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि असंतुलित प्रशिक्षण की समस्या को सफलतापूर्वक कम करती है और मजबूत बेसलाइन सिस्टम पर पर्याप्त सुधार प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'Нейронные сети, как правило, постепенно забывают ранее полученные знания при последовательном изучении нескольких задач из динамических распределений данных. Эта задача называется \\textit{Катастрофическое забывание}, что является фундаментальной проблемой в непрерывном обучении нейронных сетей. В этой работе мы отмечаем, что катастрофическое забывание не только происходит в непрерывном обучении, но и влияет на традиционное статическое обучение. Нейронные сети, особенно модели нейронного машинного перевода, страдают от катастрофического забывания, даже если они учатся на статическом обучающем наборе. Чтобы быть конкретным, окончательная модель уделяет несбалансированное внимание обучающим образцам, где недавно подвергнутые воздействию образцы привлекают больше внимания, чем более ранние образцы. Основная причина заключается в том, что обучающие выборки не получают сбалансированного обучения при каждом обновлении модели, поэтому мы называем эту проблему \\textit{несбалансированным обучением}. Чтобы облегчить эту проблему, мы предлагаем дополнительную онлайновую дистилляцию знаний (COKD), которая использует динамически обновляемые модели преподавателей, обученных конкретным заказам данных, чтобы итеративно предоставлять дополнительные знания модели студента. Экспериментальные результаты по нескольким задачам машинного перевода показывают, что наш метод успешно решает проблему несбалансированного обучения и достигает существенных улучшений по сравнению с сильными базовыми системами.', 'ga': 'Is gnách go ndéanann líonraí néaracha dearmad de réir a chéile ar an eolas a foghlaimíodh roimhe seo agus iad ag foghlaim tascanna iolracha go seicheamhach ó dháileacháin sonraí dinimiciúla. Tugtar \\textit{dearmadadh tubaisteach} ar an bhfadhb seo, rud atá ina dhúshlán bunúsach i bhfoghlaim leanúnach líonraí néaracha. San obair seo, tugaimid faoi deara go dtarlaíonn dearmad tubaisteach ní hamháin san fhoghlaim leanúnach ach go mbíonn tionchar aige freisin ar an oiliúint statach traidisiúnta. Fulaingíonn líonraí néaracha, go háirithe samhlacha néaraistriúcháin meaisín, dearmad tubaisteach fiú má fhoghlaimíonn siad ó thacar oiliúna statach. Le bheith sonrach, tugann an tsamhail deiridh aird mhíchothrom ar shamplaí oiliúna, áit a dtarraingítear aird níos mó ar shamplaí a nochtar le déanaí ná ar shamplaí níos luaithe. Is í an bhunchúis ná nach bhfaigheann samplaí oiliúna oiliúint chothromaithe i ngach nuashonrú samhla, mar sin ainmnímid an fhadhb seo \\textit{oiliúint mhíchothrom}. Chun an fhadhb seo a mhaolú, molaimid Driogadh Comhlántach Faisnéise Ar Líne (COKD), a úsáideann samhlacha múinteoirí atá nuashonraithe go dinimiciúil agus atá oilte ar orduithe sonraí sonracha chun eolas comhlántach a sholáthar go atriallach do mhúnla an dalta. Léiríonn torthaí trialacha ar thascanna il-aistriúcháin meaisín go n-éiríonn lenár modh fadhb na hoiliúna neamhchothromaithe a mhaolú agus go mbaineann sé amach feabhsuithe suntasacha thar chórais bonnlíne láidre.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ქსელები წინ ვისწავლე მეცნიერების შემდეგ გავისწავლეთ რამდენიმე რაოდენობა დინამიკური მონაცემების განსაზღვრებით. ეს პრობლემა სახელია \\textit{catastrophic forgetting}, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელების მუშაობაში ფუნდამეტური გამოცდილება. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ დავხედავთ, რომ კატაროტური დახსოვრება არა მხოლოდ მუშაობაში სწავლებაში, მაგრამ ასევე მოვლენა ტრადიციონალური სტრატიკური განაცემი ნეიროლური ქსელები, განსაკუთრებით ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების მოდელები, კატატროფიკური დაბრძელება, თუმცა ისინი სტატიკური გაგრძელების ს განსაკუთრებული იყოს, ბოლო მოდელის განმავლობაში განმავლობაში განმავლობაში მოგზავნის მონაცემებზე, სადაც მხოლოდ გამოიყენებული მონაცემები უფრო მეტი მოგზავნის ბალანტიური მიზეზი იყო, რომ საკუთარი მოდელის განახლებაში განახლება არ მიიღებს ბალანტიური განახლება, ამიტომ ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას \\textit{imbalanced training}. ამ პრობლემას გახსნა, ჩვენ მინდა კომპლემენტური ინტელექტის მეცნიერების გახსნა (COKD), რომელიც დინამიკურად ახალგაზრულებული სწავლებელი მოდელების მონაცემები, რომელიც სტუდენტის მოდელზე განახს ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები მრავალური მაქინის გაგრძელების მომხმარებისთვის ჩვენი მეთოდი წარმატებით გახსნა უფრო მარტივი განვითარების პრობლემას და გავაკეთება ძ', 'hu': 'A neurális hálózatok hajlamosak fokozatosan elfelejteni a korábban megszerzett ismereteket, amikor több feladatot egymást követően tanulnak dinamikus adatterjesztésekből. Ezt a problémát \\textit{katasztrofális felejtés}-nek hívják, ami alapvető kihívás az ideghálózatok folyamatos tanulásában. Ebben a munkában megfigyeljük, hogy a katasztrofális felejtés nemcsak a folyamatos tanulásban fordul elő, hanem a hagyományos statikus képzésre is hatással van. Az idegi hálózatok, különösen az idegi gépi fordító modellek katasztrofális feledéstől szenvednek, még akkor is, ha statikus edzőkészletből tanulnak. Pontosabban, a végső modell kiegyensúlyozatlan figyelmet fordít a képzési mintákra, ahol a közelmúltban kitett minták nagyobb figyelmet kapnak, mint a korábbi minták. A mögöttes ok az, hogy az edzésminták nem kapnak kiegyensúlyozott edzést minden modellfrissítésnél, ezért ezt a problémát \\textit{kiegyensúlyozott edzés}-nek nevezzük el. A probléma enyhítése érdekében a kiegészítő online tudás desztillációt (COKD) javasoljuk, amely dinamikusan frissített tanármodelleket használ, amelyek speciális adatokra képzett tanári modelleket használnak, hogy iteratívan kiegészítsék a diákmodellt. Több gépi fordítási feladat kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk sikeresen enyhíti az egyensúlytalan képzés problémáját, és jelentős javulást ér el az erős alapvető rendszerekhez képest.', 'el': 'Τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα τείνουν να ξεχνούν σταδιακά τις γνώσεις που αποκτήθηκαν προηγουμένως όταν μαθαίνουν πολλαπλές εργασίες διαδοχικά από δυναμικές διανομές δεδομένων. Το πρόβλημα αυτό ονομάζεται καταστροφική λησμονή, η οποία αποτελεί θεμελιώδη πρόκληση στη συνεχή μάθηση των νευρωνικών δικτύων. Στην εργασία αυτή παρατηρούμε ότι η καταστροφική λησμονή δεν συμβαίνει μόνο στη συνεχή μάθηση αλλά επηρεάζει και την παραδοσιακή στατική εκπαίδευση. Τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα, ειδικά τα μοντέλα νευρολογικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης, υποφέρουν από καταστροφική λησμονή ακόμα και αν μάθουν από ένα στατικό εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο. Για να είμαστε συγκεκριμένοι, το τελικό μοντέλο δίνει ανισορροπημένη προσοχή στα δείγματα κατάρτισης, όπου πρόσφατα εκτεθειμένα δείγματα προσελκύουν περισσότερη προσοχή από τα προηγούμενα δείγματα. Η υποκείμενη αιτία είναι ότι τα δείγματα κατάρτισης δεν λαμβάνουν ισορροπημένη εκπαίδευση σε κάθε ενημέρωση μοντέλου, οπότε ονομάζουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα \\textit{ανισορροπημένη εκπαίδευση}. Για την ανακούφιση αυτού του προβλήματος, προτείνουμε τη συμπληρωματική διαδικτυακή απόσταξη γνώσης (η οποία χρησιμοποιεί δυναμικά ενημερωμένα μοντέλα εκπαιδευτικών εκπαιδευμένα σε συγκεκριμένες διαταγές δεδομένων για να παρέχει επαναλαμβανόμενα συμπληρωματικές γνώσεις στο μοντέλο των μαθητών. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε πολλαπλές εργασίες μηχανικής μετάφρασης δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ανακουφίζει επιτυχώς το πρόβλημα της ανισορροπημένης εκπαίδευσης και επιτυγχάνει ουσιαστικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με ισχυρά συστήματα βάσης.', 'it': "Le reti neurali tendono a dimenticare gradualmente le conoscenze acquisite in precedenza quando imparano più attività sequenzialmente da distribuzioni dinamiche di dati. Questo problema è chiamato \\textit{catastrofic forfaiting}, che è una sfida fondamentale nell'apprendimento continuo delle reti neurali. In questo lavoro, osserviamo che l'oblio catastrofico non solo avviene nell'apprendimento continuo, ma influisce anche sulla formazione statica tradizionale. Le reti neurali, in particolare i modelli di traduzione automatica neurale, soffrono di dimenticanze catastrofiche anche se imparano da un set di addestramento statico. Per essere precisi, il modello finale presta un'attenzione sbilanciata ai campioni di formazione, dove i campioni recentemente esposti attirano più attenzione rispetto ai campioni precedenti. La causa di fondo è che i campioni di allenamento non ottengono allenamento bilanciato in ogni aggiornamento del modello, quindi chiamiamo questo problema \\textit{allenamento sbilanciato}. Per alleviare questo problema, proponiamo la distillazione complementare della conoscenza online (COKD), che utilizza modelli di insegnanti aggiornati dinamicamente formati su ordini di dati specifici per fornire iterativamente conoscenze complementari al modello studentesco. I risultati sperimentali su più attività di traduzione automatica dimostrano che il nostro metodo allevia con successo il problema della formazione sbilanciata e ottiene miglioramenti sostanziali rispetto a sistemi di base forti.", 'mk': 'Neural networks tend to gradually forget the previously learned knowledge when learning multiple tasks sequentially from dynamic data distributions.  This problem is called \\textit{catastrophic forgetting}, which is a fundamental challenge in the continual learning of neural networks.  Во оваа работа, набљудуваме дека катастрофалното заборавање не се случува само во континуираното учење, туку и влијае на традиционалната статичка обука. Neural networks, especially neural machine translation models, suffer from catastrophic forgetting even if they learn from a static training set.  За да бидам специфичен, конечниот модел обрнува нерамнотежно внимание на обуката на примероците, каде неодамна изложените примероци привлекуваат повеќе внимание од претходните примероци. Основната причина е дека примероците за обука не добиваат балансирана обука во секој модел оневозможување, па го именуваме овој проблем \\textit{небалансирана обука}. To alleviate this problem, we propose Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), which uses dynamically updated teacher models trained on specific data orders to iteratively provide complementary knowledge to the student model.  Експерименталните резултати на повеќето машински преведувачки задачи покажуваат дека нашиот метод успешно го олесни проблемот на нерамнотежната обука и постигнува значителни подобрувања во однос на силните основни системи.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық желілер динамикалық деректер үлестірімінен бірнеше тапсырмаларды оқу үшін алдында үйренген білімдерді бірдей ұмытылады. Бұл мәселе "textit{ катастрофиялық ұмытылу}" деп аталады. Бұл невралдық желілерді тұрақты оқыту үшін негізгі мәселе. Бұл жұмыс ішінде қатты ұмыттау тек жалғасты оқытуда емес, сондай-ақ әдімгі статистикалық оқытуға әсер етеді. Нейрондық желілер, осылайша нейрондық компьютерді аудару үлгілері, Статистикалық оқыту бағдарламасынан үйренген болса да, катастрофиялық ұмыттардан өтеді. Ескерту үшін, соңғы үлгісі өткен үлгілер үлгілеріне бақылау үшін, жаңа тұрған үлгілер бұрынғы үлгілерінен артық болады. Негізгі себебі, әрбір үлгі жаңартуда балансияланған оқыту үлгілерін балансияланбады, сондықтан бұл мәселеді\\ textit {imbalanced training}депатаймыз. Бұл мәселеді көшірмелеу үшін біз онлайн білімдердің толық түрлендірімізді (COKD) жеткіземіз. Бұл оқушылар үлгісіне қайталанатын мәліметтерді қайталау үшін динамикалық жаңарту мұғалім үлгілерін қолдана Бірнеше машинаны аудару тапсырмаларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің әдіміміздің бағдарламалық оқыту мәселесін өзгерту және күшті негізгі жүйелердің көбірек жақсартул', 'lt': 'Neuraliniai tinklai paprastai palaipsniui pamirša anksčiau įgytas žinias, kai iš dinamiško duomenų platinimo iš eilės mokomi keli uždaviniai. Ši problem a vadinama \\textit{katastrofinis pamiršimas}, kuris yra esminis iššūkis nuolatiniame nervų tinklų mokymosi procese. Šiame darbe pastebime, kad nelaimingas pamiršimas ne tik vyksta nuolatiniame mokyme, bet ir daro poveikį tradiciniam statiniam mokymui. Neuraliniai tinklai, ypač nervinių mašinų vertimo modeliai, kenčia nuo katastrofinio pamiršimo net jei jie mokosi iš statinio mokymo rinkinio. Konkrečiai kalbant, galutiniame modelyje disbalansuotas dėmesys skiriamas mokymo mėginiams, kai neseniai apdoroti mėginiai pritraukia daugiau dėmesio nei ankstesni mėginiai. Pagrindinė priežastis yra ta, kad mokymo mėginiai nesugeba gauti subalansuoto mokymo kiekviename modelio atnaujinime, taigi pavadiname šią problem ą \\textit{disbalansuotas mokymas}. Siekiant sušvelninti šią problem ą, siūlome papildomą internetinę žinių distiliaciją (COKD), kuri naudoja dinamiškai atnaujintus mokytojų modelius, parengtus pagal konkrečius duomenų nurodymus, kad student ų modeliui pakartotinai teiktų papildomas žinias. Eksperimentiniai daugelio mašinų vertimo užduočių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas sėkmingai palengvina disbalansuoto mokymo problem ą ir gerokai pagerina tvirtas bazines sistemas.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പഠിച്ചതിന്റെ അറിവ് സ്വയമായി മറക്കുന്നു ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പേരില്\u200d \\ടെക്സ്റ്റിറ്റി {ഭീകരമായ മറക്കുന്നു} എന്നാണ് വിളിക്കുന്നത്. അത് ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്ക്  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണുന്നു, വിപത്തുകള്\u200d മറന്നുപോകുന്നത് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന പഠനത്തില്\u200d മാത്രമേ സംഭവിക്കുന്നുള്ള സ്റ്റാറ്റിക് ട്രെയിനിക്ക് സെറ്റിക്ക് പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ To be specific, the final model pays imbalanced attention to training samples, where recently exposed samples attract more attention than earlier samples.  അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ കാരണമാണ് പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാ മോഡലിന്റെയും പുതുക്കുന്നതിലും നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന പരിശീലനം ലഭ്യമാക്കു ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പരിപാടി ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d അറിവ് ഡിസ്ട്രിലേഷന്\u200d (COKD) പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക പല യന്ത്രങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതി വിജയകരമായി പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം ലഘൂകരി', 'mn': 'Динамикийн өгөгдлийн хуваарилалтын дараа олон үйл ажиллагааг сурах үед өмнө сурсан мэдлэг нь бага зэрэг мартагддаг. Энэ асуудал бол "textit{гамшигтай мартах}" гэдэг. Энэ бол мэдрэлийн сүлжээний үргэлжилсэн суралцах үндсэн сорилт. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид гамшигтай мартах нь зөвхөн үргэлжлүүлэх сургалтын тулд биш, мөн уламжлалт сургалтын тухай нөлөөлдөг. Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээг, ялангуяа мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн загварууд, гамшигтай боловсрол суралцах сургамжлалтаас суралцаж байгаа ч гэсэн мартахгүй байдаг. Тодорхой хэлбэл, сүүлийн загвар нь урьдын жишээнээс илүү анхаарал татаж байдаг. Үүний гол шалтгаан нь сургалтын жишээ нь загварын шинэчлэлд баланслагдсан сургалтыг авч чадахгүй. Тиймээс бид энэ асуудлыг \\textit{imbalanced training}-аар нэрлэдэг. Энэ асуудлыг багасгахын тулд бид оюутнуудын загвар дээр нэмэлт мэдлэг өгүүлэх шаардлагатай багш нарын динамик шинэчлэгдсэн загваруудыг ашиглаж, онлайн мэдлэг хамгийн багасгал загваруудыг дахин дахин нэмэлт мэдлэг өгдөг. Ихэнх машины орчуулалтын даалгаварын туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь үр дүнтэй тэнцвэртэй сургалтын асуудлыг багасгаж, хүчтэй суурь тогтолцооны системээс илүү сайжруулж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Neuralnettverk har tendens til å glemme dei førre lærte kunnskapene når du lærer fleire oppgåver seinare frå dynamiske datadistribusjonar. Dette problemet vert kalla \\textit{ katastrofisk glemmende}, som er ein grunnleggjande utfordring i den kontinuerlige læringa av neiralnettverk. I dette arbeidet observerer vi at katastrofisk glemmering ikkje berre skjer i kontinuerlæring, men også påvirkar den tradisjonelle statiske treninga. Neuralnettverk, spesielt neuralmaskineomsetjingsmodular, køyrer frå katastrofiske glemme sjølv om dei lærer frå eit statisk opplæring. For å vera spesifikke, blir det siste modellet både ulike oppmerksomhet til øvingsprøver, der nyleg eksponerte prøver får meir oppmerksomhet enn tidlegare prøver. Det underliggende grunnen er at øvingsprøver ikkje får balansert øving i kvar modell oppdatering, slik at vi namnar dette problemet \\textit{imbalansert øving}. For å redusera dette problemet, foreslår vi komplementær forstyring på nettverket kjennomsikt (COKD), som brukar dynamisk oppdaterte læringsmodeller som trengte på spesifikke datarekkefølgjer for å gjenoppretta komplementær kunnskap til studentmodellen. Eksperimentale resultat på fleire maskineoversettelsesoppgåver viser at metoden vårt fullførleg alleviarer problemet med ulike opplæring og gjer store forbedringar over sterke baselinjesystemer.', 'pl': 'Sieci neuronowe mają tendencję do stopniowego zapominania wcześniej zdobytej wiedzy podczas uczenia się wielu zadań sekwencyjnie z dynamicznych dystrybucji danych. Problem ten nazywa się \\textit{katastrofalne zapomnienie}, co stanowi fundamentalne wyzwanie w ciągłym uczeniu się sieci neuronowych. W niniejszej pracy obserwujemy, że katastrofalne zapomnienie występuje nie tylko w ciągłym uczeniu się, ale także wpływa na tradycyjne szkolenie statyczne. Sieci neuronowe, zwłaszcza neuronowe modele tłumaczenia maszynowego, cierpią z powodu katastrofalnego zapomnienia, nawet jeśli uczą się ze statycznego zestawu treningowego. W szczególności, ostateczny model zwraca uwagę na próbki szkoleniowe, gdzie ostatnio eksponowane próbki przyciągają więcej uwagi niż wcześniejsze próbki. Podstawową przyczyną jest to, że próbki treningowe nie otrzymują zrównoważonego treningu w każdej aktualizacji modelu, więc nazywamy ten problem \\textit{dysbalanced training}. Aby złagodzić ten problem, proponujemy komplementarną destylację wiedzy online (COKD), która wykorzystuje dynamicznie aktualizowane modele nauczycieli przeszkolone na określonych kolejnościach danych w celu iteracyjnego dostarczania wiedzy uzupełniającej model ucznia. Wyniki eksperymentalne na wielu zadaniach tłumaczenia maszynowego pokazują, że nasza metoda skutecznie łagodzi problem niezrównoważonego szkolenia i osiąga znaczną poprawę w stosunku do silnych systemów bazowych.', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale tind să uite treptat cunoștințele învățate anterior atunci când învățați mai multe sarcini secvențial din distribuțiile dinamice de date. Această problemă se numește \\textit{uitare catastrofală}, care este o provocare fundamentală în învățarea continuă a rețelelor neuronale. În această lucrare observăm că uitarea catastrofală apare nu numai în învățarea continuă, ci afectează și formarea statică tradițională. Rețelele neurale, în special modelele de traducere automată neurală, suferă de o uitare catastrofală chiar dacă învață dintr-un set de pregătire statică. Pentru a fi specific, modelul final acordă o atenție dezechilibrată eșantioanelor de formare, unde eșantioanele expuse recent atrag mai multă atenție decât eșantioanele anterioare. Cauza de bază este că eșantioanele de antrenament nu primesc antrenament echilibrat în fiecare actualizare de model, așa că numim această problemă \\textit{training dezechilibrat}. Pentru a atenua această problemă, propunem distilarea complementară a cunoștințelor online (COKD), care utilizează modele de profesori actualizate dinamic instruite pe ordinele specifice de date pentru a furniza iterativ cunoștințe complementare modelului elev. Rezultatele experimentale asupra mai multor sarcini de traducere automată arată că metoda noastră atenuează cu succes problema instruirii dezechilibrate și obține îmbunătățiri substanțiale față de sistemele de bază puternice.', 'sr': 'Neuralne mreže često postupno zaboravljaju znanje koje su prethodno naučile kada uče više zadataka u sekvenciji od dinamičnih distribucija podataka. Ovaj problem se zove \\textit{katastrofalno zaboravljanje}, što je osnovni izazov u kontinualnom učenju neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu, primećujemo da se katastrofski zaboravljanje ne samo događa u kontinualnom učenju, već i utiče na tradicionalnu statičku obuku. Neuralne mreže, posebno neuralne modele prevođenja mašine, patiju od katastrofičkog zaboravljanja čak i ako nauče od statičkog set a obuke. Za specifični način, konačni model obraća nepravilnu pažnju na uzorke obuke, gdje nedavno izloženi uzorci privlače više pažnje nego ranije uzorke. Pod temeljnim razlogom je da uzorci obuke ne dobijaju balanciranu obuku u svakoj aktualizaciji modela, pa nazivamo ovaj problem \\textit{imbalansiranoj obuci}. Da bi ublažili ovaj problem, predlažemo komplementarno uništenje znanja na internetu (COKD), koji koristi dinamički aktualizirane nastavne modele obučene na određenim naređenjima podataka kako bi ponovno pružili komplementarno znanje studentskom modelu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na višestrukim poslovima za prevođenje mašina pokazuju da naša metoda uspešno olakšava problem nelabalansiranog treninga i postiže značajno poboljšanje nad jakim osnovnim sistemima.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් පස්සේ ඉගෙන ගත්ත දැනය අමතක කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ගොඩක් කාර්යය ඉ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය \\textit{catAstrphic අමතක වෙලා තියෙන්නේ කියලා, ඒක න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලයේ සාමාන්\u200dය සිහින් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. මේ වැඩේ අපි බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා කියලා අමතක වෙලා තියෙන්නේ නැත්තම් ඉගෙනගන්නේ නැත්තම් පරාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථානික ප්\u200dර න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය, විශේෂයෙන්ම න්\u200dයුරල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාවක් මොඩේල්ස් වලින්, අමතක වෙලා තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන් ස් විශේෂ විදිහට, අන්තිම මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරධාන සැම්පල් වලට අන්තිම අවධානයක් දෙනවා, මෙතන මුලින් සැම්පල් වලට වඩ මුලින් කාරණය තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්න සැමැල්ම් සැලසුම් සැලසුම් වෙන්නේ නැහැ හැම මොඩේල් අවස්ථානයේ සැලසුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය අඩංගුවන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සම්පූර්ණය අන්ලයින් දන්න විශ්වාස (COKD) කිරීමට, ඒක විදියට විශේෂ දත්ත නියෝජනය සඳහා  පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයක් විතරයි අපේ විද්\u200dයාව සමහරවිට පරීක්ෂණය නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා ප', 'so': 'Shabakada naadiga ah waxey si taxadar ah u illoobaan aqoontii horay loo baray marka lagu baranayo shaqooyin badan marka lagu kala qaybsado macluumaadka kala duduwan. Dhibaatadan waxaa loo magacaabaa \\textit {catastropo forgetting}, taasi waa dhibaato muhiim ah oo ku jirta barashada shabakada cudurada oo joogtada ah. Markaas waxaynu fiirinnaa in dhibaatada halmaansano uusan ka dhicin barashada joogtada ah oo keliya, laakiin sidoo kale waxay saameyn ku yeelanayaa waxbarashada tababarka caadiga ah. Neural networks, especially neural machine translation models, suffer from catastrophic forgetting even if they learn from a static training set.  Tusaalada ugu dambeeyaa wuxuu si gaar ah u bixinayaa dhegta samooyinka tababarida aan la qiimo karin, kaas oo ugu dhowaan tusaalooyin la muujiyey ay dhaqdhaqaaqiyaan samooyinka hore. Sababta hoose waa in samooyinka waxbarashadu aysan ka helin waxbarasho siman oo dhan oo cusboonaysa model kasta, sidaas darteed waxan u magacaabnaa dhibaatadan Si loo fududeeyo dhibaatadan, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa iskuulka aqoonta internetka (COKD), kaas oo u isticmaalaya tusaalayaal macallimiin oo aad u bedeshay oo lagu baray amar gaar ah amar macluumaadka si saxda ah u siisa aqoonta iskuulka ah. Imtixaanka ku saabsan shaqooyinka turjumidda mashiinada qaarkood waxay muuqataa in qaababkayagu liibaani u fududeeyo dhibaatada waxbarashada aan sinnaan lahayn iyo in uu helo hagaajinta badan oo ka sii kordhaya nidaamka hoose ee xoogga badan.', 'sv': 'Neurala nätverk tenderar att gradvis glömma den tidigare lärda kunskapen när man lär sig flera uppgifter sekventiellt från dynamiska datadistributioner. Detta problem kallas \\textit{katastrofal glöming}, vilket är en grundläggande utmaning i det kontinuerliga lärandet av neurala nätverk. I detta arbete konstaterar vi att katastrofal glömska inte bara sker i kontinuerlig inlärning utan också påverkar den traditionella statiska träningen. Neurala nätverk, särskilt neurala maskinöversättningsmodeller, lider av katastrofal glömska även om de lär sig av en statisk träningsuppsättning. För att vara specifik ägnar den slutliga modellen obalanserad uppmärksamhet åt träningsprover, där nyligen exponerade prover uppmärksammas mer än tidigare prover. Den underliggande orsaken är att träningsprover inte får balanserad träning i varje modelluppdatering, så vi namnger detta problem \\textit{obalanserad träning}. För att lindra detta problem föreslår vi Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), som använder dynamiskt uppdaterade lärarmodeller utbildade på specifika dataorder för att iterativt ge kompletterande kunskaper till elevmodellen. Experimentella resultat på flera maskinöversättningsuppgifter visar att vår metod framgångsrikt lindrar problemet med obalanserad utbildning och uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med starka baslinjesystem.', 'ta': 'நெருக்கர் வலைப்பின்னல்கள் முன்னால் கற்றப்பட்ட அறிவை வெளிப்படையாக மறந்து விடுகிறது. பல பணிகளை பின்னர் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும இந்த பிரச்சினையை \\textit {catastrophic forgetting} என்று அழைக்கப்படுகிறது, அது புதிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை தொடர்ந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முக்கி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் பார்க்க வேண்டும் என்றால், மறந்து விடுவது தொடர்ந்து கற்றுக்கொள்வதில் மட்டும் மட்டுமே நடக்கும புதிய பிணையங்கள், குறிப்பாக புதிய இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மாதிரிகள், ஒரு நிலையான பயிற்சி அமைப்பிலிருந்து கற்றாலு குறிப்பிட்டாக இருக்க, கடைசி மாதிரி பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளுக்கு ஒற்றைப்படையான கவனத்தை கொடுக்கும், சமீபத்தில் வெளியிடப்பட அடிப்படையான காரணத்தால் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள் ஒவ்வொரு மாதிரியிலும் நிலையான பயிற்சி புதுப்பிக்காது, எனவே நாம் இந்த பிரச்சின இந்த பிரச்சினையை முறைப்படுத்த, நாம் சிக்கல் அறிவு மாற்றம் (COKD) பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது மாணவன் மாதிரிக்கு சில தரவு கட்டளைகளில் பயிற்சி ஆசிரியர் மாதிரிகள பல இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணிகளின் சோதனையின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'نیورال نیٹ ورک پہلے سے علم کو بھول جاتا ہے جب بہت سی کاموں کو سیکھنے کے بعد ڈینمانیک ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ کے تقسیم سے لگے جاتے ہیں۔ اس مسئلہ کا نام ہے \\textit{catastrophic forgetting}، جو نئورل نیٹورک کی ہمیشہ تعلیم میں بنیادی چال ہے. اس کام میں ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ مصیبت بھول جانے کی بات نہیں صرف ہمیشہ تعلیم میں ہوتی ہے بلکہ سنتی سٹیٹی تعلیم پر بھی اثر دیتی ہے نیورال نیٹورک، مخصوصاً نیورل ماشین ترجمہ موڈل، مصیبت سے بھول جاتے ہیں، اگرچہ وہ ایک ایسی ترکین سٹ سے سیکھتے ہیں۔ خاص ہونے کے لئے آخری موڈل کی تعلیم نمونوں پر غیر قابل توجه دیتا ہے جہاں اگلے نمونوں سے زیادہ توجه اٹھاتا ہے۔ بنیادی دلیل یہ ہے کہ ترینسی نمونڈے ہر نمونڈل اڈڈیٹ میں برالنس ترینسی نہیں پاتے، تو ہم اس مسئلہ کا نام لیتے ہیں \\textit{imbalanced training}. اس مسئلہ کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے، ہم کامل آنلاین علم Distillation (COKD) کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جس نے استاد موڈل کو دوبارہ تکرار کرنے کے لئے تعلیم دی گئی مخصوص دکھانے کے ذریعے استعمال کئے ہوئے استاد کے ذریعے مطابق دکھانے والی معلومات کا استعمال کرتا ہے. بہت سی ماشین ترجمہ کے کاموں پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ سفارشی کے ساتھ مشکل کو آسان کر دیتا ہے اور مضبوط بنسٹلین سیستموں پر بہت زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'mt': 'Neural networks tend to gradually forget the previously learned knowledge when learning multiple tasks sequentially from dynamic data distributions.  Din il-problem a tissejjaħ \\textit{tinsa katastrofika}, li hija sfida fundamentali fit-tagħlim kontinwu tan-netwerks newrali. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna nużaw li tinsa katastrofika mhux biss fit-tagħlim kontinwu iżda taffettwa wkoll it-taħriġ statiku tradizzjonali. Neural networks, especially neural machine translation models, suffer from catastrophic forgetting even if they learn from a static training set.  To be specific, the final model pays imbalanced attention to training samples, where recently exposed samples attract more attention than earlier samples.  The underlying cause is that training samples do not get balanced training in each model update, so we name this problem \\textit{imbalanced training}.  To alleviate this problem, we propose Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), which uses dynamically updated teacher models trained on specific data orders to iteratively provide complementary knowledge to the student model.  Riżultati esperimentali dwar kompiti multipli ta’ traduzzjoni bil-magni juru li l-metodu tagħna jtaffi b’suċċess il-problema ta’ taħriġ żbilanċjat u jikseb titjib sostanzjali fuq sistemi ta’ linja bażi b’saħħithom.', 'ms': 'Neural networks tend to gradually forget the previously learned knowledge when learning multiple tasks sequentially from dynamic data distributions.  This problem is called \\textit{catastrophic forgetting}, which is a fundamental challenge in the continual learning of neural networks.  In this work, we observe that catastrophic forgetting not only occurs in continual learning but also affects the traditional static training.  Neural networks, especially neural machine translation models, suffer from catastrophic forgetting even if they learn from a static training set.  To be specific, the final model pays imbalanced attention to training samples, where recently exposed samples attract more attention than earlier samples.  The underlying cause is that training samples do not get balanced training in each model update, so we name this problem \\textit{imbalanced training}.  To alleviate this problem, we propose Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), which uses dynamically updated teacher models trained on specific data orders to iteratively provide complementary knowledge to the student model.  Experimental results on multiple machine translation tasks show that our method successfully alleviates the problem of imbalanced training and achieves substantial improvements over strong baseline systems.', 'uz': "Name Bu muammo \\textit {catastrophic forgetting}' deb nomlanadi. Bu neyrol tarmoqlarni davomida o'rganishda muhim qismi. Bu ishda biz o'ylab ko'rayapmiz, o'ylab o'tkazib o'rganishni faqat davomida o'rganishni o'zgartiradi, balki tabiiy statik ta'limga o'zgartiradi. Name Koʻrsatilgan bo'lsa, oxirgi model taʼminlovchi misollariga qo'shiladi. Yaqinda ko'proq misollar oldin sampledan ko'proq o'xshash mumkin. Mavjud sababi, o'rganish mumkin, har bir modeldagi o'xshash taʼminlovchi o'rganish mumkin emas, shunday qilamiz bu muammolarni textit {imkoniyatli trening}. To alleviate this problem, we propose Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), which uses dynamically updated teacher models trained on specific data orders to iteratively provide complementary knowledge to the student model.  Bir necha mashina tarjima qilish vazifalarining tajribalarini ko'rsatish mumkin, bizning usuli muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini ko'rsatadi va bir necha mashina tarjima tizimda katta o'zgarishni oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': "Các mạng thần kinh có xu hướng quên đi những kiến thức được học trước khi học các công việc đa dạng nhau từ các phân phát dữ liệu động. Vấn đề này được gọi là \\ textit Dễ quên lãng thảm họa., đó là một thử thách cơ bản trong việc học liên tục các mạng thần kinh. Trong công việc này, chúng ta nhận thấy sự quên lãng thảm họa không chỉ xảy ra trong việc học liên tục mà còn ảnh hưởng đến giáo dục tĩnh truyền thống. Hệ thần kinh, đặc biệt là hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh, phải chịu sự quên lãng thảm khốc kể cả khi chúng học từ một bộ huấn luyện tĩnh. Để cụ thể hơn, mẫu cuối cùng chú ý không đúng về các mẫu tập luyện, nơi các mẫu được phơi nhiễm gần đây thu hút nhiều sự chú ý hơn mẫu trước. Nguyên nhân cơ bản là các mẫu tập luyện không được huấn luyện cân bằng trong mỗi lần cập nhật mô hình, nên chúng tôi đặt tên vấn đề này'textit/huấn luyện thiếu cân bằng'. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị nấu ăn mạch phụ (COKD), sử dụng các mô hình giáo viên được cập nhật động động động từ các đơn vị dữ liệu cụ thể để hỗ trợ kiến thức bổ sung với mô hình sinh viên. Kết quả thử nghiệm với nhiều công việc dịch chuyển máy cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta giải quyết thành công vấn đề về huấn luyện thiếu cân bằng và đạt được những cải tiến lớn hơn hệ cơ bản vững chắc.", 'bg': 'Невралните мрежи са склонни постепенно да забравят наученото преди това знание, когато изучават множество задачи последователно от динамични разпределения на данни. Този проблем се нарича катастрофално забравяне, което е основно предизвикателство в непрекъснатото учене на невронните мрежи. В тази работа наблюдаваме, че катастрофалното забравяне не само се случва при непрекъснатото учене, но и засяга традиционното статично обучение. Невралните мрежи, особено моделите на невронен машинен превод, страдат от катастрофално забравяне, дори ако се учат от статичен тренировъчен комплект. За да бъдем по-конкретни, крайният модел обръща неравномерно внимание на пробите за обучение, където наскоро изложените проби привличат повече внимание, отколкото по-ранните проби. Основната причина е, че тренировъчните проби не получават балансирано обучение при всяка актуализация на модела, така че наричаме този проблем \\дисбалансирано обучение}. За да облекчим този проблем, предлагаме Допълнителна Онлайн Дестилация на Знанието (която използва динамично актуализирани модели на учители, обучени по конкретни поръчки от данни, за итеративно осигуряване на допълващи знания към студентския модел. Експерименталните резултати по множество задачи за машинен превод показват, че методът ни успешно облекчава проблема с дисбалансираното обучение и постига значителни подобрения в сравнение със силните базови системи.', 'hr': 'Neuralne mreže često postupno zaboravljaju ranije naučeno znanje kada uče više zadataka slično iz dinamičnih distribucija podataka. Ovaj problem se zove \\textit{katastrofalno zaboravljanje}, što je osnovni izazov u kontinualnom učenju neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu, posmatramo da se katastrofa zaboravljanja ne samo događa u kontinualnom učenju, već i utječe na tradicionalnu statičku obuku. Neuralna mreža, posebno modeli prevoda neuralnih strojeva, pati od katastrofičkog zaboravljanja čak i ako nauče od statičkog treninga. Završni model obraća nezakonitu pažnju na uzorke obuke, gdje nedavno izloženi uzorci privlače više pažnje nego ranije uzorke. U temelju toga je da uzorci obuke ne dobijaju balanciranu obuku u svakoj aktualizaciji modela, pa nazivamo ovaj problem \\textit{imbalansiranoj obuci}. Za ublažavanje ovog problema predlažemo komplementarno uništenje znanja online (COKD), koji koristi dinamički aktualizirane nastavne modele obučene na određenim naredbama podataka kako bi ponovno pružili komplementarno znanje učeniku modelu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na višestrukim zadatkima prevođenja strojeva pokazuju da naša metoda uspješno smanjuje problem nelagođene obuke i postiže značajno poboljšanje nad jakim početnim sustavima.', 'de': 'Neuronale Netzwerke neigen dazu, das zuvor erlernte Wissen allmählich zu vergessen, wenn sie mehrere Aufgaben nacheinander aus dynamischen Datenverteilungen lernen. Dieses Problem nennt man \\textit{catastrofal forgetting}, was eine grundlegende Herausforderung für das kontinuierliche Lernen neuronaler Netze darstellt. In dieser Arbeit beobachten wir, dass katastrophales Vergessen nicht nur im kontinuierlichen Lernen auftritt, sondern auch das traditionelle statische Training beeinflusst. Neuronale Netze, insbesondere neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungsmodelle, leiden unter katastrophalem Vergessen, selbst wenn sie aus einem statischen Trainingsset lernen. Konkret betrachtet das endgültige Modell Schulungsproben, bei denen kürzlich exponierte Proben mehr Aufmerksamkeit erregen als frühere Proben. Die zugrunde liegende Ursache ist, dass Trainingsmuster nicht in jedem Modell-Update ausgewogenes Training erhalten, daher nennen wir dieses Problem \\textit{Ungleichgewichttraining}. Um dieses Problem zu lindern, schlagen wir Komplementäre Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD) vor, die dynamisch aktualisierte Lehrermodelle verwendet, die auf bestimmten Datenreihen trainiert werden, um iterativ ergänzendes Wissen zum Schülermodell bereitzustellen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an mehreren maschinellen Übersetzungsaufgaben zeigen, dass unsere Methode erfolgreich das Problem des unausgewogenen Trainings lindert und wesentliche Verbesserungen gegenüber starken Basissystemen erzielt.', 'nl': 'Neurale netwerken hebben de neiging om de eerder opgedane kennis geleidelijk te vergeten wanneer ze meerdere taken opeenvolgend leren van dynamische gegevensdistributies. Dit probleem wordt \\textit{catastrofal vergeten} genoemd, wat een fundamentele uitdaging is in het voortdurend leren van neurale netwerken. In dit werk zien we dat catastrofale vergeten niet alleen voorkomt in continu leren, maar ook invloed heeft op de traditionele statische training. Neurale netwerken, vooral neurale machine translation modellen, lijden onder catastrofale vergeten, zelfs als ze leren van een statische trainingsset. Om specifiek te zijn, besteedt het uiteindelijke model onevenwichtige aandacht aan trainingsmonsters, waar recent blootgestelde monsters meer aandacht trekken dan eerdere monsters. De onderliggende oorzaak is dat trainingsvoorbeelden niet in elke model update evenwichtige training krijgen, dus we noemen dit probleem \\textit{onevenwichtige training}. Om dit probleem op te lossen, stellen we Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD) voor, die gebruikmaakt van dynamisch bijgewerkte lerarenmodellen die zijn getraind op specifieke gegevensorders om iteratief aanvullende kennis te verstrekken aan het studentenmodel. Experimentele resultaten op meerdere machine translation taken tonen aan dat onze methode succesvol het probleem van onevenwichtige training verlicht en aanzienlijke verbeteringen bereikt ten opzichte van sterke baseline systemen.', 'da': 'Neurale netværk har tendens til gradvist at glemme den tidligere lærte viden, når man lærer flere opgaver sekventielt fra dynamiske datadistributioner. Dette problem kaldes \\textit{katastrofal forglemmelse}, som er en grundlæggende udfordring i den fortsatte læring af neurale netværk. I dette arbejde konstaterer vi, at katastrofal glemmelse ikke kun forekommer i løbende læring, men også påvirker den traditionelle statiske træning. Neurale netværk, især neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller, lider af katastrofal glemmelse, selvom de lærer af et statisk træningssæt. For at være specifik lægger den endelige model ubalanceret vægt på træningsprøver, hvor nyligt eksponerede prøver tiltrækker større opmærksomhed end tidligere prøver. Den underliggende årsag er, at træningsprøver ikke får afbalanceret træning i hver model opdatering, så vi navngiver dette problem \\textit{ubalanced training}. For at afhjælpe dette problem foreslår vi Supplementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), som bruger dynamisk opdaterede lærermodeller trænet på specifikke dataordrer til iterativt at give supplerende viden til elevmodellen. Eksperimentelle resultater på flere maskinoversættelsesopgaver viser, at vores metode med succes lindrer problemet med ubalanceret træning og opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til stærke basissystemer.', 'id': 'Jaringan saraf cenderung untuk secara perlahan-lahan melupakan pengetahuan sebelumnya ketika mempelajari beberapa tugas secara urutan dari distribusi data dinamik. Masalah ini disebut \\textit{catastrofik melupakan}, yang merupakan tantangan dasar dalam pembelajaran terus menerus jaringan saraf. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memperhatikan bahwa melupakan bencana tidak hanya terjadi dalam belajar terus menerus tetapi juga mempengaruhi latihan statis tradisional. Jaringan saraf, terutama model terjemahan mesin saraf, menderita dari melupakan bencana bahkan jika mereka belajar dari set latihan statis. Untuk menjadi spesifik, model akhir membayar perhatian yang tidak seimbang pada sampel pelatihan, di mana sampel yang baru-baru ini terkena menarik perhatian lebih dari sampel sebelumnya. Alasan utama adalah bahwa sampel pelatihan tidak mendapatkan pelatihan yang seimbang dalam setiap model update, jadi kami menyebut masalah ini \\textit{pelatihan yang tidak seimbang}. Untuk mengurangi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan Pengetahuan Komplimentar Online Distillation (COKD), yang menggunakan model guru yang dinamis terbaru dilatih pada perintah data khusus untuk memberikan pengetahuan komplementar pada model siswa. Hasil eksperimen dalam beberapa tugas terjemahan mesin menunjukkan bahwa metode kami sukses mengurangi masalah pelatihan yang tidak seimbang dan mencapai peningkatan yang konsideral atas sistem dasar yang kuat.', 'ko': '동적 데이터 분포에서 여러 임무를 순서대로 학습할 때 신경 네트워크는 종종 이전에 배운 지식을 점차 잊어버린다.이 문제는 재난적 망각이라고 불리며 신경 네트워크의 지속적인 학습에 대한 기본적인 도전이다.이 작업에서 우리는 재난적인 망각이 지속적인 학습에서 발생할 뿐만 아니라 전통적인 정적 훈련에도 영향을 미치는 것을 관찰했다.신경 네트워크, 특히 신경 기계 번역 모델은 정적 훈련에서 집중적으로 공부해도 재난적인 망각을 당한다.구체적으로 최종 모델은 훈련 샘플에 대한 관심의 불균형으로 최근 노출된 샘플이 이전 샘플보다 더 많은 관심을 끌고 있다.근본적인 원인은 트레이닝 샘플이 매번 모델 업데이트에서 균형 트레이닝을 받지 못했기 때문에 이 문제를 \\text {unbalanced training}이라고 명명합니다.이를 완화하기 위해 특정 데이터 순서에 따라 훈련하는 동적으로 업데이트된 교사 모델을 사용해 학생 모델에 상호보완 지식을 반복적으로 제공하는 상호보완 온라인지식추출(COKD)을 제안했다.여러 개의 기계 번역 임무에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 강기선 시스템에 비해 우리의 방법은 훈련의 불균형 문제를 성공적으로 완화시키고 현저한 개선을 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Mitandao ya kijamii bado husahau kwa taratibu maarifa ya zamani yaliyojifunza wakati wa kujifunza kazi kadhaa mara kwa mara kutoka kwa usambazaji wa taarifa za kidini. Tatizo hili linaitwa \\textit {maafa ya kusahau}, ambayo ni changamoto ya msingi katika kuendelea kujifunza mitandao ya kijamii. Katika kazi hii, tunaona kwamba janga la kusahau sio tu linatokea katika kujifunza kwa muda mrefu bali pia linaathiri mafunzo ya kitamaduni. Mitandao ya kijamii, hususani mifano ya kutafsiri mashine ya ubongo, yanakabiliwa na kusahau maafa hata kama wanajifunza kutoka kwenye seti ya mafunzo ya takwimu. To be specific, the final model pays imbalanced attention to training samples, where recently exposed samples attract more attention than earlier samples.  Sababu ya msingi ni kwamba sampuli za mafunzo hazijapata mafunzo ya usawa katika kila mtindo wa habari, kwa hiyo tunaita tatizo hili {mafunzo ya usawa}. Ili kuondoa tatizo hili, tunapendekeza Kuondoa Ujuzi wa Mtandaoni (COKD), ambalo hutumia mifano mpya ya walimu waliofundishwa kwa njia mpya kuhusu amri maalum za data ili kwa ujumla kutoa maarifa ya kompyuta kwa mfano wa wanafunzi. Matokeo ya majaribio juu ya kazi za kutafsiri mashine kadhaa yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu kwa ufanisi unaweza kupunguza tatizo la mafunzo yasiyo na usawa na kupata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya mfumo wa msingi wa msingi.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی به طور تدریج دانش\u200cهای پیش آموخته را فراموش می\u200cکنند وقتی از طریق تقسیم داده\u200cهای دینامیک تعلیم بسیاری از کار\u200cهای متعدد را از طریق تعلیم یاد می\u200cگیرند. این مشکل به نام \\textit{ فراموش ناراحتی}، که یک چالش بنیادی در یادگیری دائمی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی است. در این کار، مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که فراموش کردن فاجعه\u200cای نه تنها در یادگیری دائمی اتفاق می\u200cافتد، بلکه همچنین بر آموزش آموزش آموزشی سنتی تأثیر می\u200cدهد. شبکه\u200cهای عصبی، مخصوصا مدل ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی، از فراموش ناراحتی دردناک می\u200cگیرند حتی اگر از مجموعه آموزش\u200cهای ثابت یاد بگیرند. برای خاص بودن، مدل نهایی توجه نابرابری به نمونه\u200cهای آموزش می\u200cدهد، جایی که نمونه\u200cهای اخیرا نشان داده شده\u200cاند توجه بیشتری از نمونه\u200cهای قبلی را جذب می\u200cکنند. دلیل زیر این است که نمونه\u200cهای آموزش آموزش در هر روزگاری مدل تطبیق نمی\u200cشوند، بنابراین ما این مشکل را به نام \\textit{آموزش نابرابری}می\u200cنامیم. برای آسان کردن این مشکل، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تقسیم دانش\u200cهای کامل آنلاین (COKD) که از مدل\u200cهای معلم\u200cهای دینامیک آغاز شده\u200cاند که بر دستورات داده\u200cهای خاص آموزش داده شده\u200cاند برای بازگشت دانش\u200cهای کامل به مدل دانش\u200cآموزان استفاده می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی کار های ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما با موفقیت مشکل آموزش نابرابری را کمتر می\u200cکند و بهترین زیادی در سیستم\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای قوی می\u200cرسد.', 'tr': 'Näral şebekeler öňki öňki bilgi öwrenip bilýändigini ýatdan çykarýar. Bu mesele "textit{katastrofiýany unutmak}" diýilip atlandyrylýar. Bu neural şebekeleriň dowam etmeli öwrenmesinde esasy kynçylykdyr. Bu işde biz diňe daşary öwrenmede däl, daşary statistik okuwçylara täsirleýäris diňe ýatdan çykarmakda däldigini gözleýäris. Niral şebekeler, özellikle näyral maşynyň terjime modelleri, bir statik okuw düzümlerinden öwrenenlerden hem bu şekilde boýunça ýatdan çykaryp barýarlar. Aýratyn bolmak üçin, iň soňky nusga örän öňki nusgalardan has öňki nusgalardan köp üns çekýär. Yükselen sebäbi, okuw örnekleri her nusga güncelleştirilmeýändir. Bu sebäbi biz bu meseleni \\textit{imbalanced training}-da adlandyrýarys. Bu meseleni azaltmak üçin, okuwçylar nusgasyna ýene-täpli bilgi berebilmek üçin dinamik taýýarlanan mugallymyň nusgalaryny ulanýarys. Birnäçe maşynyň terjime etmegi üçin örän netijeleri ukyplarymyzyň ýüzüniň täsirinde täsirlenmedik okuwçylygyň meseläni boşadyr we güýçli baseline sistemalaryň üstünde örän gowuraklary çykarýar.', 'af': "Neurale netwerke tendeer gradief te vergeet die voorheen leer kennis wanneer veelvuldige taak sekwensies leer van dinamiese data verspreidings. Hierdie probleem word genoem \\textit{ katastrofiske vergeet}, wat is 'n fundamentele uitdrukking in die voortdurende leer van neuralnetwerke. In hierdie werk, ons sien dat katastrofiske vergeet nie net in die voortdurende leer gebeur nie, maar ook die tradisionele statiese onderwerp afvloek. Neurale netwerke, veral neurale masjien vertalingsmodele, lyk van katastrofiske vergeet selfs as hulle leer van 'n statiese onderwerp stel. Om spesifieke te wees, betaal die eindelike model onbalanse aandag aan optrekking voorbeelde, waar onlangs uitgevoerde voorbeelde meer aandag as vroeëre voorbeelde aantrek. Die onderstelde oorsaak is dat oefening voorbeelde nie balanse oefening in elke model opdateer kry nie, sodat ons hierdie probleem naam \\textit{imbalanseerde oefening}. Om hierdie probleem te verminder, voorstel ons volledige Onlinene kennis verspreiding (COKD), wat dynamies opgedateerde onderwysermodele gebruik wat op spesifieke data bevele opgelei is om weergawe complementeerde kennis te verskaf aan die student model. Eksperimentele resultate op veelvuldige masjien vertaling opdragte vertoon dat ons metode suksesvol die probleem van onbalanseerde onderwerp verlos en betaling verbeteringe oor sterke basisline stelsels bereik.", 'am': 'የኔural networks ቀድሞ የተማረቡትን እውቀት እውቀትን በተለየ ጊዜ ከዲያሜሎክ ዳታ ክፍተት በመማር ይረሳሉ፡፡ ይህ ጉዳዩ የደብዳቤ መረብ ማወቂያ መሠረት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የረሳው ግጭት በዘወትር ትምህርት ብቻ ሳይሆን ነገር ግን የባሕላዊው ስታሪክ ትምህርት እንዲያስጨንቀው እናደርጋለን፡፡ የኔውራዊ መረብ፣ በተለየ የናውራዊ መሣሪያን ትርጉም ሞዴላዎች፣ ከተስታሪክ ትምህርት ማግኘት ቢተማሩ እንኳ ካልተሳስተው በጥፋት መከራ ይቀጣሉ፡፡ To be specific, the final model pays imbalanced attention to training samples, where recently exposed samples attract more attention than earlier samples.  የዋና ምክንያት ምሳሌዎች በሁሉም ሞዴል ላይ ማስተካከል ማድረግ እንዳይችሉ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም ጉዳዩን የጽሑፍ ትምህርት {ትምህርት}ብለንእናስባለን፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማሳየት፣ ለተማሪው ሞዴላዎችን በሥልጣን የሚጠቅመውን የዳታ ትእዛዛቶች በማስተካከል አስተማሪን ማሻሻል እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በብዙ መሣሪያዎች ትርጉም ስራዎች ላይ የመፈተና ፍሬዎች የሆኑን ሥርዓታችን የስህተት ትምህርት ስህተት ማቀናኘት እና በብርቱ መሳሪያ ስርዓት ላይ የበለጠ ትክክል ማድረግ እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Rrjetet neuronale kanë tendencë të harrojnë gradualisht njohuritë e mësuara më parë kur mësojnë detyra të shumta sekuencuese nga shpërndarjet dinamike të të dhënave. This problem is called \\textit{catastrophic forgetting}, which is a fundamental challenge in the continual learning of neural networks.  Në këtë punë, ne vëzhgojmë se harrimi katastrofik ndodh jo vetëm në mësimin e vazhdueshëm por gjithashtu prek trainimin tradicional statik. Rrjetet nervore, veçanërisht modelet e përkthimit të makinave nervore, vuajnë nga harrimi katastrofik edhe nëse mësojnë nga një set trajnimi statik. Për të qenë specifik, modeli përfundimtar jep vëmendje të paekuilibruar për ushtrimin e mostrave, ku mostrat e ekspozuara kohët e fundit tërheqin më shumë vëmendje se mostrat e mëparshme. The underlying cause is that training samples do not get balanced training in each model update, so we name this problem \\textit{imbalanced training}.  To alleviate this problem, we propose Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), which uses dynamically updated teacher models trained on specific data orders to iteratively provide complementary knowledge to the student model.  Rezultatet eksperimentale në detyrat e përkthimit të shumëfishtë të makinave tregojnë se metoda jonë lehtëson me sukses problemin e trajnimit të paekuilibruar dhe arrin përmirësime thelbësore lidhur me sistemet bazë të forta.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցերը հակված են աստիճանաբար մոռանալ նախկինում սովորված գիտելիքները, երբ բազմաթիվ առաջադրանքներ սովորում են դինամիկ տվյալների տարածումներից: Այս խնդիրը կոչվում է \\Texit{կոտրոֆիկ մոռացում}, որը հիմնական մարտահրավեր է նյարդային ցանցերի շարունակական սովորելու համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք նկատում ենք, որ կոտրոֆիկ մոռացումը տեղի է ունենում ոչ միայն շարունակական ուսումնասիրության մեջ, այլ նաև ազդում է ավանդական վիճակական ուսումնասիրության վրա: Նյարդային ցանցերը, հատկապես նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելները, տառապում են քանդակային մոռացումից, նույնիսկ եթե սովորեն ստատիկ վարժման համակարգից: Որպես կոնկրետ ասած, վերջնական մոդելը անհավասար ուշադրություն է դարձնում նմուշների ուսումնասիրությանը, որտեղ վերջերս բացահայտված նմուշները ավելի շատ ուշադրություն են գրավում քան նախորդ նմուշները: Հիմնական պատճառը նրանում է, որ փորձի նմուշները հավասարակշռություն չեն ստանում յուրաքանչյուր մոդելի վերականգնման մեջ, ուստի մենք անվանում ենք այս խնդիրը \\Texit{անհավասարակշռություն փորձի}: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք համացանցում ընդլայնված գիտելիքների դիստիլացիա (COKԴ), որը օգտագործում է դինամիկ վերականգնված ուսուցիչների մոդելներ, որոնք վարժեցվել են որոշակի տվյալների հրամանների վրա, որպեսզի կրկնօրինակ կերպով Մեքենայի թարգմանման բազմաթիվ խնդիրների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը հաջողությամբ նվազեցնում է անհավասարակշռության ուսումնասիրության խնդիրը և հասնում է նշանակալի բարելավումների հ', 'az': 'Nöral ağları daha öncə öyrənmiş bilgi öyrəndiyi zaman çoxlu işləri dinamik məlumat dağıtından sonra öyrəndiyi vaxt tələb edir. Bu problem in adı \\textit{ katastrofi unutması} - nöral a ğlarının həmişəlik öyrənməsində əsas çətinlikdir. Bu işdə, həmişəlik öyrənməkdə deyil, həmişəlik istiqamətlərə də müvafiq təhsil etmişdir. Nöral a ğları, özlərinə də nöral maşın çeviri modelləri, statik təhsil quruluşundan öyrəndikləri halda, hətta qəribə unutmaqdan əziyyət verirlər. Əksinə olaraq, son modeli təhsil nömrələrinə müəyyən edilməli təhsil göstərir. Bu nömrələr çox əvvəlki nömrələrdən daha çox təhsil edir. İlk səbəbi is ə təhsil nömrələri hər modellərdə müəyyən edilən təhsil edilməkdir. Biz bu problemi \\textit{imbalansed təhsil} adlandırırıq. Bu problemi yüngülləşdirmək üçün, öğrenci modelini daha çox bilgi vermək üçün dinamik olaraq yenilənmiş müəllimin modellərini istifadə edir. Müxtəlif maşına çevirilmiş işlərdə təcrübə sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim metodumuz müəyyən edilməmiş təcrübələrin problemini yüngülləşdirir və qüvvətli təcrübə sistemlərinin çox yaxşılıqlarını başa düşər.', 'bs': 'Neuralne mreže često postupno zaboravljaju ranije naučeno znanje kada uče više zadataka sekvenciji iz dinamičnih distribucija podataka. Ovaj problem se zove \\textit{katastrofalno zaboravljanje}, što je osnovni izazov u kontinualnom učenju neuralnih mreža. U ovom poslu, posmatramo da se katastrofa zaboravljanja ne samo događa u kontinualnom učenju, već i utiče na tradicionalnu statičku obuku. Neuralne mreže, posebno neuralne modele prevođenja strojeva, patiju od katastrofičkog zaboravljanja čak i ako nauče od statičkog set a obuke. Za specifični način, konačni model obraća nepravilnu pažnju na uzorke obuke, gdje nedavno izloženi uzorci privlače više pažnje nego ranije uzorke. U temelju toga je da uzorci obuke ne dobijaju balanciranu obuku u svakoj aktualizaciji modela, pa nazivamo ovaj problem \\textit{imbalansiranoj obuci}. Da bi ublažili ovaj problem, predlažemo komplementarno uništenje znanja na internetu (COKD), koji koristi dinamički aktualizirane nastavne modele obučene na određenim naredbama podataka kako bi ponovno pružili komplementarno znanje studentskom modelu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na višestrukim zadatkima prevođenja mašina pokazuju da naša metoda uspješno smanjuje problem nelabalansiranog treninga i postiže značajno poboljšanje nad jakim početnim sistemima.', 'ca': "Les xarxes neuronales tendeixen a oblidar gradualment el coneixement abans aprengut quan aprenen múltiples tasques seqüencialment a partir de distribucions dinàmiques de dades. Aquest problem a s'anomena textit{oblidança catastròfica}, que és un repte fonamental en l'aprenentatge continu de les xarxes neurals. En aquest treball observem que l'oblidar catastròfic no només ocorre en l'aprenentatge continu, sinó afecta també l'entrenament estatic tradicional. Les xarxes neurals, especialment els models de traducció de màquines neurals, pateixen d'oblidar catastròficament fins i tot si aprenen d'un conjunt d'entrenaments estàtics. Per ser específic, el model final presta una atenció desequilibrada a la formació de mostres, on mostres exposades fa poc atrauen més atenció que mostres anteriors. The underlying cause is that training samples do not get balanced training in each model update, so we name this problem \\textit{imbalanced training}.  Per aliviar aquest problema, proposem Destillació Complementar de Conexus Online (COKD), que utilitza models de professors dinàmicament actualitzats entrenats en ordins específics de dades per proporcionar iterativament coneixements complementars al model estudiant. Els resultats experimentals en múltiples tasques de traducció de màquines mostren que el nostre mètode allivia amb èxit el problema de l'entrenamient desequilibrat i aconsegueix millores substancials sobre sistemes de base forts.", 'bn': 'নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ধীরে ধীরে ভুলে যাচ্ছে পূর্ববর্তী জ্ঞানের কথা যখন বেশ কিছু কাজ শিখতে পারে তখন ডায়ামিক ডাটা বিতরণ থেক এই সমস্যাটিকে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক শিক্ষার মৌলিক চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই কাজে আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে বিপর্যয় ভুলে যাওয়া শুধুমাত্র স্থানীয় প্রশিক্ষণের প্রভাব ফেলেছে না। নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, বিশেষ করে নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল, বিপর্যয় ভুলে যাওয়ার ক্ষেত্রে ভুলে যায়, এমনকি যদি তারা স্টেট নির্দিষ্ট কারণে চূড়ান্ত মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্যে অসম্পূর্ণ মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, যেখানে সম্প্রতি প্রকাশিত নমুনাগুলো পূর মূল কারণ হচ্ছে প্রশিক্ষণের নমুনা প্রত্যেক মডেল আপডেটে মানসিক প্রশিক্ষণ পাওয়া যায় না, তাই আমরা এই সমস্যার নাম নাম \\টেক্সটিট {অসম্ এই সমস্যা কমিয়ে দেওয়ার জন্য আমরা অনলাইন জ্ঞান বিভ্রান্তির প্রস্তাব করছি (ককেডি) যা ব্যবহার করে বিশেষ তথ্য নির্দেশাবলী নির্দেশে প্রশিক্ষণিত শিক্ষক মডেল ব্যবহার করে  বেশ কয়েকটি মেশিন অনুবাদের কাজের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি সফলভাবে সফলভাবে বৈষম্য প্রশিক্ষণের সমস্যা কমিয়ে দেয় এবং বেস', 'cs': 'Neurální sítě mají tendenci postupně zapomenout na dříve získané znalosti při učení se několika úkolů postupně z dynamických distribucí dat. Tento problém se nazývá \\textit{katastrofické zapomenutí}, což je základní výzva v neustálém učení neuronových sítí. V této práci pozorujeme, že katastrofické zapomínání dochází nejen v kontinuálním učení, ale také ovlivňuje tradiční statické tréninky. Neurální sítě, zejména neuronové modely strojového překladu, trpí katastrofickým zapomenutím, i když se učí ze statické tréninkové sady. Konkrétně řečeno, konečný model věnuje nevyváženou pozornost vzorkům tréninku, kde nedávno exponované vzorky přitahují větší pozornost než dřívější vzorky. Základní příčinou je, že tréninkové vzorky nedostanou v každé aktualizaci modelu vyvážený trénink, takže tento problém pojmenujeme \\textit{nerovnovážený trénink}. Pro zmírnění tohoto problému navrhujeme komplementární online znalostní destilaci (COKD), která využívá dynamicky aktualizované modely učitelů trénované na specifických datových pořadích, aby iterativně poskytovala doplňkové znalosti studentského modelu. Experimentální výsledky na více úlohách strojového překladu ukazují, že naše metoda úspěšně zmírňuje problém nevyváženého tréninku a dosahuje podstatných zlepšení oproti silným základním systémům.', 'et': 'Närvivõrgustikud kipuvad järk-järgult unustama varem omandatud teadmised, kui õpivad mitmeid ülesandeid järjestikuselt dünaamilistest andmejaotustest. Seda probleemi nimetatakse \\textit{katastroofiline unustamine}, mis on oluline väljakutse närvivõrkude pidevas õppimises. Käesolevas töös täheldame, et katastroofiline unustamine ei toimu mitte ainult pidevas õppimises, vaid mõjutab ka traditsioonilist staatilist treeningut. Neuraalsed võrgud, eriti neuromasintõlke mudelid, kannatavad katastroofilise unustamise all isegi siis, kui nad õpivad staatilisest treeningkomplektist. Täpsemalt öeldes pööratakse lõplikus mudelis tasakaalustamatut tähelepanu koolitusproovidele, kus hiljuti kokkupuutunud proovid tõmbavad rohkem tähelepanu kui varasemad proovid. Aluspõhjuseks on see, et treeningnäidised ei saa tasakaalustatud treeningut iga mudeli värskendamisel, nii et nimetame selle probleemi \\textit{tasakaalustatud treening}. Selle probleemi leevendamiseks pakume välja täiendava online teadmiste destillatsiooni (COKD), mis kasutab dünaamiliselt uuendatud õpetajamudeleid, mis on koolitatud konkreetsete andmete järjekorras, et iteratiivselt pakkuda täiendavaid teadmisi õpilase mudelile. Mitme masintõlke ülesande eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod leevendab edukalt tasakaalustamatu koolituse probleemi ja saavutab olulisi parandusi võrreldes tugevate baassüsteemidega.', 'fi': 'Neuroverkostot unohtavat vähitellen aiemmin opitun tiedon opetellessaan useita tehtäviä peräkkäin dynaamisista tiedonjakeluista. Tätä ongelmaa kutsutaan \\textit{katastrofaalinen unohtaminen}, joka on keskeinen haaste neuroverkkojen jatkuvassa oppimisessa. Tässä työssä havaitaan, että katastrofaalinen unohtaminen ei tapahdu vain jatkuvassa oppimisessa vaan vaikuttaa myös perinteiseen staattiseen harjoitteluun. Neuroverkostot, erityisesti neurokonekäännösmallit, kärsivät katastrofaalisesta unohduksesta, vaikka ne oppisivat staattisesta harjoitussarjasta. Lopullisessa mallissa kiinnitetään epätasapainoa koulutusnäytteisiin, joissa äskettäin altistuneet näytteet herättävät enemmän huomiota kuin aikaisemmat näytteet. Perussyy on se, että harjoitusnäytteet eivät saa tasapainoista koulutusta jokaisessa mallipäivityksessä, joten nimetämme tämän ongelman \\textit{epätasapainoinen koulutus}. Tämän ongelman lievittämiseksi ehdotamme Complementary Online Knowledge Distillation (COKD), joka käyttää dynaamisesti päivitettyjä opettajamalleja, jotka on koulutettu tiettyihin tietomääräyksiin, tarjotakseen iteratiivisesti täydentävää tietoa opiskelijamalliin. Kokeelliset tulokset useista konekäännöstehtävistä osoittavat, että menetelmämme lievittää menestyksekkäästi epätasapainoisen koulutuksen ongelmaa ja saavuttaa merkittäviä parannuksia vahvoihin perusjärjestelmiin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Network Bu kesalam denir \\textit(catAstrph)soko lilamcen}Bu kesalam basal kelamcen dumadhil kapan Neral netek Nang gawar iki, kita ngerti kanggo ngertukan kelas kuwi, nganggo ngerti sedhaya kuwi mau, dadi, nik sekang tukang layanan liyane kuwi mau. Nyerul tambah, karo model itolet kuwi, kuwi wis rampun nang rak kelas, nganggo kelas kuwi mau Rasané sing berarti, model ikèn dhèwèké bakal dumadhi tanggal nggo sampul luwih dumadhi, ingkang sampul sing isinaké nyoto mesthi operasan. Samsul podho kelompok, dadi, nik kabeh wektu nggawe sistem atualizasi model sing, dadi awak dhéwé isih perbudhakan \\textit {balancied Learning} Ngawe nglanggar wigat barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo nggawe Komplintari Gak Kenalén Distilén (CoKDE), sing gambar ngewigat modèl anyeste guru nggawe barang kelas kuwi nggawe data aturan sing berarti iso nggawe akeh nyebuturan dhéwé karo model kuwi bawat. Rehunong sing paling nggawe sistem tarjamahan ing sak bantayan', 'sk': 'Živčna omrežja postopoma pozabijo na predhodno pridobljeno znanje, ko se učijo več opravil zaporedno iz dinamičnih distribucij podatkov. Ta problem se imenuje \\textit{katastrofalno pozabljanje}, kar je temeljni izziv pri nenehnem učenju nevronskih omrežij. V tem delu opažamo, da katastrofalno pozabljanje ne pride le v stalnem učenju, temveč vpliva tudi na tradicionalno statično vadbo. Živčna omrežja, zlasti modeli nevronskega strojnega prevajanja, trpijo zaradi katastrofalnega pozabljanja, tudi če se učijo iz statičnega treninga. Končni model namenja neravnoteženo pozornost vzorcem usposabljanja, kjer nedavno izpostavljeni vzorci pritegnejo več pozornosti kot prejšnji vzorci. Osnovni vzrok je, da vzorci treninga ne dobijo uravnoteženega treninga pri vsaki posodobitvi modela, zato težavo poimenovamo \\textit{neravnoteženo trening}. Za lajšanje te težave predlagamo dopolnilno spletno destilacijo znanja (COKD), ki uporablja dinamično posodobljene modele učiteljev, usposobljene po določenih vrstnih redu podatkov, da iterativno zagotavlja dopolnilno znanje študentskemu modelu. Eksperimentalni rezultati pri več opravilih strojnega prevajanja kažejo, da naša metoda uspešno ublaži problem neravnoteženega usposabljanja in dosega bistvene izboljšave v primerjavi z močnimi osnovnimi sistemi.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin neural na zaman su manta da ilmi na gabani a lokacin da za'a karanta wasu aikin daban daga rabo data. Wannan suna suna /text tit Daga wannan aikin, Munã ganin cewa matar mantarwa ba ta sãmu ba fãce a cikin barci daidai kuma amma yana yi amfani da wa'anar static. Shiryoyin neural, da amfani da misãlai masu fassarar mashine na neura, za'a zartar da su kan astroiki na mantawa, kuma kõ dã sun ci daga tsarin ta static. To be specific, the final model pays imbalanced attention to training samples, where recently exposed samples attract more attention than earlier samples.  Sabar da ke ƙari shine, misãlai na ƙidãya ba su iya amfani da daidaita cikin kowace motel, don haka kuma muna sunan wannan suna To, dõmin sauƙaƙara wannan muammãni, Munã buƙata Composition of Cilmi Online (COKD), wanda ke yin amfani da misãlai na macallin da aka sanar da su a cikin sha'anar da aka ƙayyade masu hususann data dõmin a bãyar da ilimi na kamfata zuwa motel na ardani. Matarin jarrabawa a kan aikin masu turjuya masu yawa na nuna cewa metoden mu, yana mai cin nasara ta sauƙaƙara matsalar wa aikin da ba'a daidaita ba, kuma ya sami mafiya kyau a kanzu masu ƙaranci na tsarin basalin.", 'he': 'רשתות נוירות נוטות לשכוח באופן שלילי את הידע שנלמד קודם כאשר ללמוד משימות רבות ברצף מהפיצוי נתונים דינמיים. הבעיה הזאת נקראת \\ textit {שכחה קטסטרופית}, שהוא אתגר בסיסי בללמד המשך של רשתות עצביות. בעבודה הזו, אנו רואים ששכחה קטסטרופית לא רק מתרחשת בללמד ממשיך, אלא גם משפיעה על האימון הסטטי המסורתי. רשתות נוירוליות, במיוחד דוגמני תרגום מכונות נוירוליות, סובלות מהשכחה קטסטרופית אפילו אם הם לומדים מסט אימון סטטי. כדי להיות ספציפי, המודל הסופי משלם תשומת לב לא מאוזנת לדגימות האימון, שבו דגימות חשופות לאחרונה מושכות תשומת לב יותר מדגימות קודמות. הסיבה הנוכחית היא שדגימות אימון לא מקבלות אימון מאוזן בכל עידכון מודל, אז אנחנו קוראים לבעיה זו \\textit{אימון לא מאוזן}. כדי להקל על הבעיה הזאת, אנו מציעים דיסטילציה תוספת של ידע באינטרנט (COKD), אשר משתמשת במודלים מורים מעודכנים דינמית מאומנים על פקודות נתונים ספציפיים כדי לספק ידע תוספת באופן יותר למודל הסטודנט. תוצאות ניסויים על משימות תרגום מכונות רבות מראות שהשיטה שלנו מצליחה להקל את הבעיה של אימון לא מאוזן ולהשיג שיפורים משמעותיים מעל מערכות בסיסיות חזקות.', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱིས་སྔོན་གྱི་ཤེས་ཚད་ལ་འཛིན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐབས་སུ། This problem is called \\textit{catastrophic forgetting}. It is a fundamental challenge in the continual learning of neural networks. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྗེད་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སློབ་རྩོམ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་དུས་གཏོང་མཁན་དག་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེན རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་དུ་རྒྱུད་མེད་ལག་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་བརྗེད་དུ་འཇུག ཆེས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་སྨན་པར་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The underlying cause is that training samples do not get balanced training in each model update, so we name this problem \\textit{imbalanced training}. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལྷག་པར་བཟོ་བ་པར་ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་མཐོང་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་། ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞི་རྒྱས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་'}
{'en': 'Bilingual alignment transfers to multilingual alignment for unsupervised parallel text mining', 'ar': 'الاستعارات في نماذج اللغة التي تم تدريبها مسبقًا: الاستقصاء والتعميم عبر مجموعات البيانات واللغات', 'es': 'Metáforas en modelos de lenguaje preentrenados: sondeo y generalización en conjuntos de datos e idiomas', 'pt': 'Metáforas em modelos de linguagem pré-treinados: sondagem e generalização entre conjuntos de dados e linguagens', 'fr': 'Métaphores dans les modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés\xa0: exploration et généralisation à travers les ensembles de données et les langues', 'zh': '预训语言模隐喻:跨数集语探泛化', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルにおけるメタファー：データセットと言語全体の調査と一般化', 'hi': 'पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल में रूपक: डेटासेट और भाषाओं में जांच और सामान्यीकरण', 'ru': 'Метафоры в предварительно обученных языковых моделях: зондирование и обобщение в наборах данных и языках', 'ga': 'Meafair i Múnlaí Teanga RéamhOilte: Scrúdú agus Ginearálú ar Thacair Sonraí agus Theangacha', 'ka': 'მეტაფორები წინ განსწავლებული ენის მოდელში: მონაცემების და გენერალაციის გარეშე მონაცემების და ენების გარეშე', 'el': 'Μεταφόρες σε Προπαιδευμένα Γλωσσικά Μοντέλα: Έλεγχος και Γενικοποίηση σε σύνολα δεδομένων και γλώσσες', 'hu': 'Metafórák az előképzett nyelvi modellekben: Vizsgálat és általánosítás adatkészletek és nyelvek között', 'it': 'Metafore nei modelli linguistici pre-formati: analisi e generalizzazione tra set di dati e lingue', 'lt': 'Metaforai iš anksto parengtuose kalbų pavyzdžiuose: bandymas ir generalizavimas duomenų rinkiniuose ir kalbose', 'kk': 'Алдыңғы оқылған тіл үлгілерінде метафоры: Деректер және тілдер арасында сынақтау және жалпы түрлендіру', 'mk': 'Метафори во предобучените јазички модели: Проверка и генерализација низ базите на податоци и јазици', 'ms': 'Metafora dalam Model Bahasa Latihan Terdahulu: Pengujian dan Jeneralisasi Melalui Set Data dan Bahasa', 'mt': 'Metaphors in Pre-Trained Language Models: Probing and Generalization Across Datasets and Languages', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളിലെ മെറ്റാപ്പോര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Өмнөх сургалтын хэл загваруудын метафор: өгөгдлийн өгөгдлийн болон хэл дээр судалж болон бий болгох', 'pl': 'Metafory w przeszkolonych modelach językowych: sondowanie i uogólnianie w zestawach danych i językach', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Metafore în modelele lingvistice pre-instruite: sondare și generalizare în seturi de date și limbi', 'sr': 'Metafori u predobučenim jezičkim modelima: ispitivanje i generalizacija preko podataka i jezika', 'sv': 'Metaforer i förberedda språkmodeller: Probing och generalisering över datauppsättningar och språk', 'so': 'Metaphors in Pre-Trained Models: Probining and Generalization Across Datasets and Languages', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளில் மெட்ஹோர்கள்: தரவு அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் மொழிகள் மூலம் செயல்படுத்துதல்', 'ur': 'پہلے تطالب زبان موڈل میں متفارر: ڈاٹائیس اور زبانوں کے درمیان تحقیق اور جرائنال', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phép ẩn trong chế độ ngôn ngữ học trước:', 'bg': 'Метафори в предварително обучени езикови модели: сондиране и генерализиране между набори от данни и езици', 'da': 'Metaforer i foruddannede sprogmodeller: Probing og generalisering på tværs af datasæt og sprog', 'hr': 'Metafori u predobučenim jezičkim modelima: ispitivanje i generalizacija preko podataka i jezika', 'nl': 'Metaforen in voorgetrainde taalmodellen: Proberen en generaliseren over datasets en talen', 'id': 'Metafora dalam Model Bahasa Berlatihan Pra: Pengujian dan Generalisasi Melalui Dataset dan Bahasa', 'ko': '미리 훈련된 언어 모델 중의 은유: 크로스 데이터 집합과 언어의 탐색과 개괄', 'fa': 'Metaphors in Pre- Trained Language Models: Test and Generalization Through Databases and Languages', 'de': 'Metaphern in vortrainierten Sprachmodellen: Sondierung und Generalisierung über Datensätze und Sprachen hinweg', 'tr': 'Öňki Ewirlenen Diller modinde Metaforler: Denemek we Umumlandyrma Maglumatlar we Diller', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Metafora në modelet e gjuhës së paratrajnuara: Probimi dhe gjeneralizimi nëpërmjet bazave të dhënash dhe gjuhëve', 'am': 'ቋንቋዎች', 'hy': 'Metaphors in Pre-Trained Language Models: Probing and Generalization Across Datasets and Languages', 'az': '√Ėn t…ôhsil edilmiŇü Dil Modell…ôrind…ô Metaforl…ôr: Verici v…ô Generalizasyon √úst√ľnd…ô Veril…ôr v…ô Dill…ôr', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী ট্রেনিং ভাষা মডেলে মেটাফোর: ডাটাসেট এবং ভাষা', 'bs': 'Metafori u predobučenim jezičkim modelima: ispitivanje i generalizacija preko podataka i jezika', 'ca': 'Metafòries en Models de Llingua Pre-Format: Probar i Generalitzar a través de paquets de dades i llengües', 'et': 'Metafoorid eelõpetatud keelemudelites: andmekogumite ja keelte proovimine ja üldistamine', 'cs': 'Metafory v předškolených jazykových modelech: sondování a zobecnění napříč datovými sadami a jazyky', 'fi': 'Esikoulutettujen kielimallien metaforit: tietoaineistojen ja kielten kartoitus ja yleistyminen', 'sw': 'Tovuti katika Modeli za Lugha zilizojifunza kabla: Kuzalisha na Ujumla Kupitia Taarifa na Lugha', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'מטאפורות במדלים שפות מאומנות מראש: ניסוי וגנרליזציה ברחבי קבצי נתונים ושפות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Metafore v predusposabljenih jezikovnih modelih: prodiranje in generalizacija med nabori podatkov in jeziki', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྐུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ནང་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས། བརྟག་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'This work presents methods for learning cross lingual sentence representations using paired or unpaired bilingual texts We hypothesize that the cross lingual alignment strategy is transferable and therefore a model trained to align only two languages can encode multilingually more aligned representations We thus introduce dual pivot transfer training on one language pair and evaluating on other pairs To study this theory we design unsupervised models trained on unpaired sentences and single pair supervised models trained on bitexts both based on the unsupervised language model XLM R with its parameters frozen The experiments evaluate the models as universal sentence encoders on the task of unsupervised bitext mining on two datasets where the unsupervised model reaches the state of the art of unsupervised retrieval and the alternative single pair supervised model approaches the performance of multilingually supervised models The results suggest that bilingual training techniques as proposed can be applied to get sentence representations with multilingual alignment', 'ar': 'تمتلئ اللغات البشرية بالتعابير المجازية. تساعد الاستعارات الناس على فهم العالم من خلال ربط المفاهيم والمجالات الجديدة بمفاهيم ونطاقات أكثر مألوفة. لذلك يُفترض أن النماذج اللغوية الكبيرة المدربة مسبقًا (PLM) تقوم بتشفير المعرفة المجازية المفيدة لأنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بالتحقيق في هذه الفرضية الخاصة بـ PLM ، من خلال التحقق من معلومات الاستعارة في ترميزاتها ، وقياس التعميم عبر اللغات ومجموعة البيانات المشتركة لهذه المعلومات. نقدم دراسات في مجموعات بيانات متعددة للكشف عن الاستعارة وبأربع لغات (أي الإنجليزية والإسبانية والروسية والفارسية). تشير تجاربنا المكثفة إلى أن التمثيلات السياقية في PLMs تقوم بترميز المعرفة المجازية ، وفي الغالب في طبقاتها الوسطى. المعرفة قابلة للنقل بين اللغات ومجموعات البيانات ، خاصةً عندما يكون التعليق التوضيحي متسقًا عبر مجموعات التدريب والاختبار. تقدم النتائج التي توصلنا إليها رؤى مفيدة لكل من العلماء الإدراكيين وعلماء البرمجة اللغوية العصبية.', 'fr': "Les langues humaines regorgent d'expressions métaphoriques. Les métaphores aident les gens à comprendre le monde en reliant de nouveaux concepts et domaines à des concepts plus familiers. Les grands modèles de langage pré-entraînés (PLM) sont donc supposés coder des connaissances métaphoriques utiles pour les systèmes de PNL. Dans cet article, nous étudions cette hypothèse pour les PLM, en sondant les informations de métaphoricité dans leurs codages, et en mesurant la généralisation de ces informations entre les langues et les ensembles de données. Nous présentons des études dans de multiples ensembles de données de détection de métaphore et en quatre langues (anglais, espagnol, russe et farsi). Nos expériences approfondies suggèrent que les représentations contextuelles dans les PLM codent des connaissances métaphoriques, principalement dans leurs couches intermédiaires. Les connaissances sont transférables entre les langues et les ensembles de données, en particulier lorsque l'annotation est cohérente entre les ensembles de formation et de test. Nos résultats fournissent des informations utiles pour les scientifiques cognitifs et les spécialistes de la PNL.", 'es': 'Los lenguajes humanos están llenos de expresiones metafóricas. Las metáforas ayudan a las personas a entender el mundo al conectar nuevos conceptos y dominios con otros más familiares. Por lo tanto, se supone que los grandes modelos lingüísticos preentrenados (PLM) codifican conocimientos metafóricos útiles para los sistemas de PNL. En este artículo, investigamos esta hipótesis para los PLM, sondeando la información de metaforicidad en sus codificaciones y midiendo la generalización de esta información en varios idiomas y conjuntos de datos. Presentamos estudios en múltiples conjuntos de datos de detección de metáforas y en cuatro idiomas (es decir, inglés, español, ruso y farsi). Nuestros extensos experimentos sugieren que las representaciones contextuales en los PLM sí codifican el conocimiento metafórico, y sobre todo en sus capas intermedias. El conocimiento es transferible entre lenguajes y conjuntos de datos, especialmente cuando la anotación es coherente en todos los conjuntos de entrenamiento y pruebas. Nuestros hallazgos brindan información útil para los científicos cognitivos y de PNL.', 'pt': 'As linguagens humanas estão cheias de expressões metafóricas. As metáforas ajudam as pessoas a entender o mundo conectando novos conceitos e domínios aos mais familiares. Portanto, assume-se que grandes modelos de linguagem pré-treinados (PLMs) codificam conhecimento metafórico útil para sistemas de PNL. Neste artigo, investigamos essa hipótese para PLMs, investigando informações de metaforicidade em suas codificações e medindo a generalização entre idiomas e conjuntos de dados dessas informações. Apresentamos estudos em vários conjuntos de dados de detecção de metáforas e em quatro idiomas (ou seja, inglês, espanhol, russo e farsi). Nossos extensos experimentos sugerem que as representações contextuais em PLMs codificam o conhecimento metafórico, e principalmente em suas camadas intermediárias. O conhecimento é transferível entre linguagens e conjuntos de dados, especialmente quando a anotação é consistente nos conjuntos de treinamento e teste. Nossas descobertas fornecem informações úteis para cientistas cognitivos e de PNL.', 'ja': '人間の言語は比喩的な表現に満ちている。メタファーは、新しい概念やドメインをより身近なものに結びつけることで、人々が世界を理解するのに役立ちます。したがって、大規模な事前に訓練された言語モデル（ ＰＬＭ ）は、ＮＬＰシステムに有用な比喩的知識を符号化すると仮定される。この論文では、PLMのためのこの仮説を調査し、エンコーディングの比喩情報を探索し、この情報のクロスリンガルおよびクロスデータセットの一般化を測定する。私たちは、複数のメタファー検出データセットと4つの言語（英語、スペイン語、ロシア語、およびファルシ語）で研究を提示します。私たちの広範な実験では、PLMにおける文脈表現は比喩的な知識をエンコードし、主にその中間層にあることが示唆されています。特に、トレーニングとテストのセット間でアノテーションが一貫している場合、ナレッジは言語とデータセットの間で転送可能です。私たちの調査結果は、認知科学者とNLP科学者の両方にとって有益な洞察を提供します。', 'zh': '人言充隐喻。 隐喻以新名、更习其名,助人知世。 是以大预训语(PLM)以为可编码NLP有用之隐喻。 于本文,探其编码隐喻性息,度其跨语跨数集泛化以究PLM之伪设。 以众隐喻检数集及四语(即英语,西班牙语,俄语与波斯语)究之。 博实验之明,PLM之上下文实编码隐喻知,而在其中间层也。 知识可移于言语数据集之间,尤当注释于训练、测试之间。 吾见知与NLP科学家有用也。', 'hi': 'मानव भाषाएं रूपक अभिव्यक्तियों से भरी हुई हैं। रूपक लोगों को नई अवधारणाओं और डोमेन को अधिक परिचित लोगों से जोड़कर दुनिया को समझने में मदद करते हैं। बड़े पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल (पीएलएम) को इसलिए एनएलपी प्रणालियों के लिए उपयोगी रूपक ज्ञान को एन्कोड करने के लिए माना जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम पीएलएम के लिए इस परिकल्पना की जांच करते हैं, उनके एन्कोडिंग में रूपक जानकारी की जांच करके, और इस जानकारी के क्रॉस-लिंगुअल और क्रॉस-डेटासेट सामान्यीकरण को मापकर। हम कई रूपक का पता लगाने वाले डेटासेट में और चार भाषाओं (यानी, अंग्रेजी, स्पेनिश, रूसी और फारसी) में अध्ययन प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारे व्यापक प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि पीएलएम में प्रासंगिक प्रतिनिधित्व रूपक ज्ञान को एन्कोड करते हैं, और ज्यादातर उनकी मध्य परतों में। ज्ञान भाषाओं और डेटासेट के बीच हस्तांतरणीय है, खासकर जब एनोटेशन प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण सेट में सुसंगत होता है। हमारे निष्कर्ष संज्ञानात्मक और एनएलपी वैज्ञानिकों दोनों के लिए उपयोगी अंतर्दृष्टि देते हैं।', 'ru': 'Человеческие языки полны метафорических выражений. Метафоры помогают людям понять мир, соединяя новые концепции и домены с более привычными. Поэтому предполагается, что крупные предварительно обученные языковые модели (PLMS) кодируют метафорические знания, полезные для систем NLP. В этой статье мы исследуем эту гипотезу для PLM, изучая информацию о метафоричности в их кодировках и измеряя межъязычное и кросс-датасетное обобщение этой информации. Мы представляем исследования в нескольких наборах данных обнаружения метафор и на четырех языках (т.е. английском, испанском, русском и фарси). Наши обширные эксперименты показывают, что контекстные представления в PLM действительно кодируют метафорические знания, и в основном в их средних слоях. Знания могут быть переданы между языками и наборами данных, особенно когда аннотация согласуется между обучающими и тестирующими наборами. Наши результаты дают полезную информацию как для когнитивных ученых, так и для ученых NLP.', 'ga': "Tá teangacha daonna lán de nathanna meafarach. Cabhraíonn meafair le daoine an domhan a thuiscint trí choincheapa agus fearainn nua a nascadh le cinn níos eolaí. Glactar leis mar sin go n-ionchódaíonn múnlaí móra teanga réamhoilte (PLManna) eolas meafarach atá úsáideach do chórais NLP. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an hipitéis seo do PLManna, trí fhaisnéis mheafarach a fhiosrú ina n-ionchóduithe, agus trí ghinearálú tras-teangach agus tras-thacar sonraí na faisnéise seo a thomhas. Cuirimid staidéir i láthair i dtacar sonraí braite meafair iolracha agus i gceithre theanga (i.e. Béarla, Spáinnis, Rúisis agus Farsi). Tugann ár dturgnaimh fhairsing le fios go n-ionchódaíonn léirithe comhthéacsúla i PLManna eolas meafarach, agus go príomha ina sraitheanna lár. Is féidir an t-eolas a aistriú idir teangacha agus tacair shonraí, go háirithe nuair a bhíonn an anótáil comhsheasmhach trasna tacair oiliúna agus tástála. Tugann ár dtorthaí léargas cabhrach d'eolaithe cognaíocha agus NLP araon.", 'ka': 'ადამიანის ენები მეტაფორიალური გამოსახულებით უყველა. მეტაფორები მოხმარებენ ადამიანებს მსოფლიოს გაგრძნობით, ახალი კონფიგურები და დომენები უფრო მეცნიერებით დაკავშირებით. ამიტომ გავაკეთებულია დიდი წარმოადგენული ენის მოდელები (PLMs) NLP სისტემისთვისთვისთვის მეტაფორიკური მეცნიერების კოდირება. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ ამ ჰიპოტეზას PLMs-სთვის გამოყენებთ, მატაფორიკულობის ინფორმაციის შესახებ, და ამ ინფორმაციის ზენერალიზაციის კრისი ენგუფიკალური და კრისი დიატატის ზენერალ ჩვენ მეტაფორის მონაცემების მონაცემების მეტაფორის მონაცემების და ოთხი ენაში (ანგლისური, სპანელი, პროსია და ტაპსი). ჩვენი უფრო დიდი ექსპერიმენტები იყველას, რომ კონტექსტური რესპერიმენტები PLMs-ში მეტაფორიკური ცოცხლებები კოდირებენ, და უფრო მეტაფორ მეცნიერება ენაზები და დეტატისტების შორის გადატანიზებელია, განსაკუთრებით როდესაც ანოტაცია კონსტანტიურია განსწავლების და ტესტისტების სტებ ნაქთრვ ჲრკპთრთ ეაეარ ოჲმჲღნთ ოპვეგთე ჱა კჲნდთგთრთგნთ თ ნა NLP სფვნთუთ.', 'hu': 'Az emberi nyelvek tele vannak metaforikus kifejezésekkel. A metaforák segítenek az embereknek megérteni a világot azáltal, hogy új fogalmakat és tartományokat kapcsolnak össze az ismerősebbekhez. Ezért feltételezzük, hogy a nagy, előre képzett nyelvi modellek (PLM) az NLP rendszerek számára hasznos metaforikus ismereteket kódolnak. Jelen tanulmányban ezt a hipotézist vizsgáljuk a PLM-ekre vonatkozóan, metaforicitási információkat vizsgálva kódolásukban, valamint ezen információk keresztnyelvű és keresztadatok általánosításának mérésével. Tanulmányokat több metafora detektálási adatkészletben és négy nyelven (angol, spanyol, orosz és fárszi) mutatunk be. Kiterjedt kísérleteink arra utalnak, hogy a PLM-ekben lévő kontextuális reprezentációk metaforikus tudást kódolnak, főleg középső rétegeiket. A tudás nyelvek és adatkészletek között átvihető, különösen akkor, ha a megjegyzés következetes a képzési és tesztelési készletek között. Eredményeink hasznos betekintést nyújtanak mind a kognitív, mind az NLP tudósok számára.', 'el': 'Οι ανθρώπινες γλώσσες είναι γεμάτες μεταφορικές εκφράσεις. Οι μεταφορές βοηθούν τους ανθρώπους να κατανοήσουν τον κόσμο συνδέοντας νέες έννοιες και τομείς με πιο οικείες. Ως εκ τούτου, τα μεγάλα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα (PLMs) θεωρούνται ότι κωδικοποιούν μεταφορικές γνώσεις χρήσιμες για τα συστήματα NLP. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε αυτή την υπόθεση για τα PLM, εξετάζοντας τις πληροφορίες μεταφορικής στις κωδικοποιήσεις τους, και μετρώντας τη διασταυρούμενη και διασταυρούμενη γενίκευση των πληροφοριών αυτών. Παρουσιάζουμε μελέτες σε πολλαπλά σύνολα δεδομένων ανίχνευσης μεταφορών και σε τέσσερις γλώσσες (δηλ. αγγλικά, ισπανικά, ρωσικά και φαρσί). Τα εκτεταμένα πειράματα μας δείχνουν ότι οι περιβαλλοντικές αναπαραστάσεις στα PLM κωδικοποιούν μεταφορική γνώση, και κυρίως στα μεσαία τους στρώματα. Η γνώση είναι μεταβιβάσιμη μεταξύ γλωσσών και συνόλων δεδομένων, ειδικά όταν η σημείωση είναι συνεπής σε όλα τα σύνολα εκπαίδευσης και δοκιμών. Τα ευρήματά μας δίνουν χρήσιμες πληροφορίες τόσο για γνωστικούς όσο και για επιστήμονες της ΝΛΠ.', 'kk': 'Адам тілдері метафорикалық өрнектермен толық. Метафорлар адамдарға әлемді түсінуге көмектеседі, жаңа концепциялар мен домендерді көмектеседі. Осылайша, NLP жүйелерінде пайдалы метафорикалық білім кодтамасы үлкен тіл үлгілері (PLMs) деп ойлайды. Бұл қағазда, біз PLMs гипотезасын зерттеп, олардың кодтамасындағы метафорикалық мәліметін тексеріп, мәліметтің көп тілді және көпшілікті деректер жинағын өлшерейік. Біз бірнеше метафорды анықтау деректер қорларында және төрт тілде зерттеулерді (яғни ағылшын, испан, руссия және фарси) көрсетедік. Біздің кеңейтілген тәжірибелеріміз PLM-тың контексті түсініктері метафорикалық білімдерді кодтамыз, көбінде олардың орташа қабаттарында. Бұл білім тілдер мен деректер қорларының арасында аударуға болады, осымен қатар, оқыту және сынақтар бағдарламасында тәуелді болғанда. Біздің табуларымыз көмектесілген, NLP ғылымдарының екеуі де көмектесілген түсініктерін көрсетеді.', 'it': "I linguaggi umani sono pieni di espressioni metaforiche. Le metafore aiutano le persone a comprendere il mondo collegando nuovi concetti e domini a quelli più familiari. I grandi modelli linguistici pre-addestrati (PLM) sono quindi assunti per codificare conoscenze metaforiche utili per i sistemi NLP. In questo articolo, esaminiamo questa ipotesi per i PLM, sondando le informazioni metaforiche nelle loro codificazioni, e misurando la generalizzazione cross-lingual e cross-dataset di queste informazioni. Presentiamo studi in diversi set di dati di rilevamento metaforico e in quattro lingue (cioè inglese, spagnolo, russo e farsi). I nostri estesi esperimenti suggeriscono che le rappresentazioni contestuali nei PLM codificano la conoscenza metaforica, e soprattutto nei loro strati intermedi. Le conoscenze sono trasferibili tra lingue e set di dati, soprattutto quando l'annotazione è coerente tra set di formazione e test. I nostri risultati forniscono informazioni utili sia per gli scienziati cognitivi che per quelli della PNL.", 'lt': 'Žmogaus kalbos yra pilnos metaforinių išraiškų. Metaforos padeda žmonėms suprasti pasaulį, sujungdamos naujas koncepcijas ir sritis su labiau žinomomis. Todėl manoma, kad dideli iš anksto parengti kalbų modeliai koduoja metaforines žinias, naudingas NLP sistemoms. Šiame dokumente tiriame šią hipotezę dėl PLM, ištirdami metaforiškumo informaciją jų koduose ir išmatuodami šios informacijos tarpkalbinį ir tarpduomenų rinkinį. Pateikiame įvairių metaforų aptikimo duomenų rinkinių ir keturių kalbų (t. y. anglų, ispanų, rusų ir farsių) tyrimus. Mūsų ekstensyvūs eksperimentai rodo, kad kontekstinis atstovavimas PLM koduoja metaforines žinias ir daugiausia jų viduriniuose sluoksniuose. The knowledge is transferable between languages and datasets, especially when the annotation is consistent across training and testing sets.  Mūsų išvados suteikia naudingą supratimą tiek pažintiniams, tiek NLP mokslininkams.', 'mk': 'Човечките јазици се полни со метафорски изрази. Метафорите им помагаат на луѓето да го разберат светот со поврзување на новите концепти и домени со попознати. Затоа се претпоставува дека големите предобучени јазички модели (ПЛМ) кодираат метафорско знаење корисно за NLP системите. Во овој весник ја истражуваме оваа хипотеза за ПЛМ, со истражување на метафорични информации во нивните кодирања, и со мерење на генерализацијата на крстојазичните и крстојазичните податоци на овие информации. Презентираме студии во многуте набори на податоци за детекција на метафори и на четири јазици (т.е., англиски, шпански, руски и фарси). Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека контекстуалните претставувања во ПЛМ кодираат метафорско знаење, и претежно во нивните средни слоеви. Знаењето може да се пренесе помеѓу јазиците и податоците, особено кога анотацијата е константна меѓу обуките и тестовите. Our findings give helpful insights for both cognitive and NLP scientists.', 'ms': 'Bahasa manusia penuh dengan ungkapan metafora. Metafora membantu orang memahami dunia dengan menghubungkan konsep dan domain baru dengan yang lebih biasa. Model bahasa pra-dilatih besar (PLMs) dianggap untuk mengekod pengetahuan metaforik berguna untuk sistem NLP. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki hipotesis ini untuk PLMs, dengan menyelidiki maklumat metafori dalam pengekodan mereka, dan dengan mengukur keseluruhan set data salib dan salib maklumat ini. Kami memperkenalkan kajian dalam set data pengesan metafora berbilang dan dalam empat bahasa (iaitu bahasa Inggeris, Sepanyol, Rusia, dan Farsi). Eksperimen luas kami menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan kontekstual dalam PLM mengekodkan pengetahuan metaforik, dan kebanyakan dalam lapisan tengah mereka. Pengetahuan boleh dipindahkan diantara bahasa dan set data, terutama apabila anotasi konsisten melalui set latihan dan ujian. Penemuan kami memberikan pandangan yang berguna untuk saintis kognitif dan NLP.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഭാഷകള്\u200d മെറ്റോഫിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d നിറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്നു. മെറ്റാഫോര്\u200dസ് ലോകത്തെ മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d ആളുകള്\u200dക്ക് സഹായിക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ ആശയങ്ങളും ഡോമെന്\u200dസും കൂടുതല്\u200d പരി Large pre-trained language models (PLMs) are therefore assumed to encode metaphorical knowledge useful for NLP systems.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, പിഎല്\u200dഎസിന്റെ ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസ് നാം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു, അവയുടെ കോഡിങ്ങിലെ മെതിഫോഫിക്രിറ്റിയിറ്റി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതും  ഒരുപാട് മാറ്റഫോര്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താനുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും നാലു ഭാഷകളിലും നാം പഠിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പിഎല്\u200dമിസിലെ സാധാരണ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മെറ്റോഫോഫിക്കല്\u200d അറിവിന്റെ കോഡിങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു, പ ഭാഷകളും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളും തമ്മിലുള്ള അറിവ് മാറ്റുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പരിശീലനത്തിനും പരീക്ഷ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d എന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപി ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞര്\u200dക്കും സഹായിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Il-lingwi umani huma mimlija b’espressjonijiet metaforiċi. Il-metafori jgħinu lin-nies jifhmu d-dinja billi jgħaqqdu kunċetti u dominji ġodda ma’ dawk aktar familjari. Large pre-trained language models (PLMs) are therefore assumed to encode metaphorical knowledge useful for NLP systems.  F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw din l-ipoteżi għall-PLMs, billi ninvestigaw l-informazzjoni dwar il-metaforiċità fl-ikkodifikazzjonijiet tagħhom, u billi nikkejlu l-ġeneralizzazzjoni tas-sett ta’ dejta translingwi u translingwi ta’ din l-informazzjoni. Aħna nippreżentaw studji f’settijiet ta’ dejta multipli ta’ detezzjoni ta’ metafori u f’erba’ lingwi (jiġifieri, Ingliż, Spanjol, Russu, u Farsi). L-esperimenti estensivi tagħna jissuġġerixxu li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet kuntestwali fil-PLMs jikkodifikaw l-għarfien metaforiku, u l-aktar fis-saffi medji tagħhom. L-għarfien huwa trasferibbli bejn il-lingwi u s-settijiet tad-dejta, speċjalment meta l-annotazzjoni tkun konsistenti fis-settijiet tat-taħriġ u l-ittestjar. Is-sejbiet tagħna jagħtu għarfien utli kemm għax-xjenzati konjittivi kif ukoll għax-xjenzati NLP.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний хэл нь метафорик илэрхийллээс дүүрэн. Метафор нь хүмүүст дэлхийг ойлгоход шинэ ойлголт болон сүлжээг илүү ойлгомжтой хүмүүстэй холбоотой. Иймээс NLP системд ашигтай метафорик мэдлэг шинэчлэхэд том хэл загвар (ПЛМ) байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид PLMs-ийн хувьд энэ талаар судалж, тэдний кодлогын метафорик мэдээллийг судалж, мөн энэ мэдээллийн олон хэл болон олон өгөгдлийн сангийн ерөнхийлөгчийг хэмжиж байна. Бид олон метафор мэдээллийн сангууд болон 4 хэл дээр судалгааг үзүүлдэг. Бидний өргөн туршилтууд ПЛМ-ын орчин үеийн үзүүлэлт нь метафорик мэдлэг, ихэнхдээ дундаж давхар дээр кодлогддог. Мэдлэг нь хэл болон өгөгдлийн санг хоорондоо шилжүүлж чадах боломжтой. Ялангуяа дасгал болон шалгалтын хэлбэрүүдийн хоорондоо тохиромжтой байх үед. Бидний ололтууд мэдлэгтэй болон НLP эрдэмтэд хоёуланг ашигтай ойлголт өгдөг.', 'pl': 'Ludzkie języki są pełne metaforycznych wyrażeń. Metafory pomagają ludziom zrozumieć świat, łącząc nowe koncepcje i domeny z bardziej znanymi. Zakłada się zatem, że duże wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe (PLM) kodują wiedzę metaforyczną przydatną dla systemów NLP. W niniejszym artykule badamy tę hipotezę dla PLM, badając informacje metaforyczne w ich kodowaniu oraz mierząc uogólnienie tych informacji między językami i zbiorami danych. Przedstawiamy badania w wielu zbiorach danych wykrywających metafory oraz w czterech językach (tj. angielskim, hiszpańskim, rosyjskim i farsi). Nasze rozległe eksperymenty sugerują, że kontekstowe reprezentacje w PLM kodują wiedzę metaforyczną, a głównie w ich środkowych warstwach. Wiedza może być przenoszona między językami i zbiorami danych, zwłaszcza gdy adnotacja jest spójna w zestawach szkoleniowych i testowych. Nasze odkrycia dają pomocne informacje zarówno dla naukowców poznawczych, jak i NLP.', 'no': 'Menneske språk er full av metaforiske uttrykk. Metaforar hjelper folk å forstå verden ved å kopla nye konseptar og domene til meir kjente. Det er derfor anta at store føreøvinga språk- modeller (PLMs) skal kodera metaforiske kunnskap som er nyttig for NLP- systemet. I denne papiret undersøker vi denne hipotesen for PLMs ved å prøve metaforitetsinformasjon i kodingane sine, og ved å måle det generelliseringen av krysspråk og kryss-datasettet for denne informasjonen. Vi presenterer studiar i fleire metaforoppdagingsdatasett og i fire språk (t.d. engelsk, spansk, russisk og farsi). Våre utvidde eksperimenter tyder på at kontekstlege representasjonar i PLMs koder metaforisk kunnskap, og hovudsakelig i middellagene sine. Kvitninga kan overførast mellom språk og datasett, spesielt når notasjonen er konsistent over trening og testsett. Finningane våre gjev hjelp innsyning for både kognitiv og NLP-vitenskaplege.', 'ro': 'Limbile umane sunt pline de expresii metaforice. Metaforele ajută oamenii să înțeleagă lumea conectând concepte și domenii noi la cele mai familiare. Prin urmare, se presupune că modelele lingvistice mari pre-instruite (PLM) codifică cunoștințele metaforice utile sistemelor PNL. În această lucrare, investigăm această ipoteză pentru PLM, prin sondarea informațiilor metaforice în codările lor și prin măsurarea generalizării translingvistice și cross-dataset a acestor informații. Prezentăm studii în mai multe seturi de date de detectare a metaforelor și în patru limbi (engleză, spaniolă, rusă și farsi). Experimentele noastre extinse sugerează că reprezentările contextuale din PLM codifică cunoștințele metaforice, și mai ales în straturile lor de mijloc. Cunoștințele sunt transferabile între limbi și seturi de date, mai ales atunci când adnotările sunt coerente în seturile de instruire și testare. Descoperirile noastre oferă informații utile atât pentru oamenii de știință cognitive, cât și pentru cei de știință din PNL.', 'sr': 'Ljudski jezici su puni metaforskih izraza. Metafori pomažu ljudima da razumeju svijet povezujući nove koncepte i domene sa poznatijima. Stoga se pretpostavlja da veliki predobučeni jezički modeli (PLMs) kodiraju metaforske znanje korisne za NLP sisteme. U ovom papiru istražujemo ovu hipotezu za PLMs-e, probajući metaforičnu informaciju u njihovim kodiranjima, i mjerenjem generalizacije preko jezika i preko podataka ove informacije. Predstavljamo studije na višestrukim metaforama i na četiri jezika (tj. engleski, španjolski, ruski i farsi). Naši široki eksperimenti sugeriraju da kontekstualne predstave u PLMs kodiraju metaforske znanje, i uglavnom u njihovim srednjim slojevima. Znanje je prebacivo između jezika i seta podataka, posebno kada je annotacija u skladu s obukom i testovima. Naši nalazi pružaju pomoæne uvide za kognitivne i NLP nauènike.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු භාෂාවල් මෙටාෆෝරික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මෙටාෆෝර්ස් මිනිස්සුන්ට ලෝකය තේරුම් ගන්න උදව් කරන්න, අලුත් අදහස් සහ ඩෝමේන්ස් එක්ක සම්බන් ලොකු ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් (PlMs) නිසා NLP පද්ධතිය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dර මේ පැත්තට, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂා කරන්නේ ප්\u200dලිම්ස් වලට, ඔවුන්ගේ සංකේතයේ මෙටාෆෝරිකිටි තොරතුරු පරීක්ෂා කරන්න, ඒ වගේම ම අපි ගොඩක් මෙටාෆෝර් හොයාගන්න දත්ත සෙට් වලින් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා (ඉංග්\u200dරීසි, ස්පැනිස්, රුසියා, ෆර්සි)  අපේ විශාල පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක දන්නවය භාෂාවයි දත්ත සැට් අතර ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න පුළුවන්, විශේෂයෙන්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ පරීක්ෂණ සැට අපේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් අදහස් දෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ NLP විද්\u200dයාඥයෝ දෙන්නම්.', 'so': 'Luqadaha dadka waxaa ka buuxa hadal qaab ah. Metafores waxay dadka ka caawinayaan inay dunida gartaan, waxayna ku xiriiraan fikrada cusub iyo deegaanka kuwa aad u yaqaan. Sidaa darteed waxaa loo malaynayaa inaad kooban karto aqoonta qaabilsan oo uu u faa’iido leh nidaamka NLP. Qoraalkan waxaan ku baaraynaa munaafimaadkan PLMs, si aan ugu baarayno macluumaadka faa’iidada, iyo qiyaastiisa luuqada iskutallaabta ah iyo koritaanka macluumaadkan. Waxaannu wax ku baranaynaa koorasyada aqoonsiga oo kala duduwan iyo afarta luqadood (tusaale ahaan Ingiriis, Isbanish, Ruush iyo Farsi). Our extensive experiments suggest that contextual representations in PLMs do encode metaphorical knowledge, and mostly in their middle layers.  Aqoonta waxaa lagu beddeli karaa luuqadaha iyo macluumaadka, khusuusan marka lagu soo bandhigi karo qoraalka waxbarashada iyo imtixaanka. Shaqooyinkayada waxay faa’iido u bixiyaan waxyaabaha caawinta ah ee aqoonta iyo cilmiyiinta NLP.', 'sv': 'Mänskliga språk är fulla av metaforiska uttryck. Metaforer hjälper människor att förstå världen genom att ansluta nya begrepp och domäner till mer bekanta. Stora förklädda språkmodeller (PLM) antas därför koda metaforisk kunskap användbar för NLP-system. I denna uppsats undersöker vi denna hypotes för PLM, genom att sondera metaforicitetsinformation i deras kodningar, och genom att mäta tvärspråklig och tvärdataset generalisering av denna information. Vi presenterar studier i flera datauppsättningar för metafordetektering och på fyra språk (dvs engelska, spanska, ryska och farsi). Våra omfattande experiment tyder på att kontextuella representationer i PLM kodar metaforisk kunskap, och mestadels i deras mellanlager. Kunskapen kan överföras mellan språk och datauppsättningar, särskilt när noteringen är konsekvent över utbildnings- och testuppsättningar. Våra fynd ger användbara insikter för både kognitiva och NLP forskare.', 'ta': 'மனித மொழிகள் முழுமையான வெளிப்பாடுகள் நிரப்பப்பட்டுள்ளன. மெட்காப்போர்கள் உலகத்தை புரிந்து கொள்ள உதவுகின்றனர் புதிய கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் களங்களை மேலும் அறிந்தவர பெரிய முன்பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகள் (PLMs) ஆகையால் NLP அமைப்புகளுக்கு பயனுள்ள மொழி அறிவை குறியீடு செய்ய பயனுள்ளது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் PLMs க்கான இந்த hypothesis ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம், அவற்றின் குறியீடுகளில் உலாவிய தகவல்களை சோதிக்கிறோம், மற்றும் இந்த தகவலின் கு நாம் பல வகையான கண்டுபிடிப்பு தரவுத்தளங்களிலும் நான்கு மொழிகளிலும் படிப்பியல்களை காண்பிக்கிறோம் (அதாவது, ஆங்கிலம நம்முடைய விரிவான சோதனைகள் பிஎல்எம்ஸில் உள்ள தற்போதைய குறிப்பிடும் அறிவை குறியீடு செய்யும் பெரும்பாலாக அவைகள அறிவு மொழிகள் மற்றும் தரவுத்தளங்களுக்கும் இடையே மாற்றப்படுகிறது, குறிப்பாக பயிற்சி மற்றும் சோதனை அமைப்பு எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் தெரியும் மற்றும் NLP அறிவியலாளர்களுக்கு உதவியான பார்வைகள் கொடுக்கும்.', 'ur': 'انسان کی زبانیں مٹوفوریک مثالیں سے بھری ہیں۔ مٹیفور لوگوں کو دنیا کی سمجھ سے مدد کرتا ہے کہ نئی نظریں اور دامنوں کو زیادہ معلوم لوگوں کے ساتھ پیدا کریں۔ لہٰذا NLP سیستم کے لئے فائدہ اٹھانے والی مٹا فوریک علم کے لئے بڑے پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل (PLMs) کا انتظام کیا جاتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم پلمز کے لئے اس فرضی کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، ان کے اکنوڈیزوں میں metaphoricity معلومات کی تحقیق کے ذریعہ، اور اس معلومات کی کرس-زبان اور کرس-ڈیٹ سٹ کی عمومی اندازی کے ذریعہ۔ ہم بہت سی مٹافور ڈیٹ سٹ اور چار زبانوں میں پڑھتے ہیں (یعنی انگلیسی، اسپانیایی، روسی اور فارسی). ہماری وسیع آزمائش کی تفصیل یہ ہے کہ PLMs میں متفافرقی علم کو کوڈ کرتا ہے اور ان کی اکثریت وسیع طبقات میں۔ علم زبانوں اور ڈاٹ سٹوں کے درمیان تغییر دینے والا ہے، مخصوصاً جبکہ اظہار کی تعلیم اور آزمائش سٹوں میں ثابت ہوتی ہے۔ ہمارے پیدا کرنے والے علم اور NLP دانشمندوں کے لئے مددگار نظر دیتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Inson tili metaphorik ifodalar bilan ko'rib chiqadi. Metaphorlar dunyoni o'rganishga yangi g'oyalar va domenelarni ko'proq yaxhshi bilan bog'lash orqali yordam beradi. Bir nechta taʼminlovchi tillar modellari (PLMs) yani NLP tizimlari uchun foydalanuvchi metaphorik ilimni kodlash mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz PLMs uchun bu hypotheyasini o'rganamiz, uning kodlash haqida metaphorikiy maʼlumotni tekshirib, va bu maʼlumotning qo'llanmalarni o'zgartirish orqali bir necha tillar va cross-maʼlumot tarkibini o'zgartirish orqali. Biz bir necha foydalanuvchi maʼlumotlar tarkibida o'rganamiz va to'rt tillarda (masalan ingliz tilida, Ispanchaga, Ruscha va Farsi). Bizning kengaytirilgan imtiyozlarimiz PLMsning davlat tashkilotlari metaphorik ilimni kodlash va ko'pchiligi o'rtadagi qatlamlarda kodlash mumkin. Ахборот тиллар ва маълумотлар орасидаги ўзгаришлар, махсус маълумот тайёргарлик ва синов таркибидаги вақтда ўзгаришлар. Our findings give helpful insights for both cognitive and NLP scientists.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ con người đầy biểu hiện ẩn dụ. Phép ẩn dụ giúp người ta hiểu thế giới bằng cách kết nối các khái niệm và miền mới đến những khái niệm phổ biến hơn. Những mô hình ngôn ngữ được huấn luyện rộng lớn (PLM) được giả định để mã hóa kiến thức trừu tượng hữu dụng cho hệ thống Njala. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta nghiên cứu giả thuyết này của các PLM, bằng cách dò tìm thông tin ẩn dụ trong các mã cấu trúc của chúng, và bằng cách đo tổng hợp thông tin này qua ngôn ngữ và thập dữ liệu. Chúng tôi giới thiệu các nghiên cứu về nhiều bộ vi tính ẩn dụ và bằng bốn ngôn ngữ (tức là Anh, Tây Ban Nha, Nga, và Farsi). Các thí nghiệm bao quát của chúng tôi cho thấy các biểu tượng ngữ chung trong các PLM đã mã hóa kiến thức trừu tượng, và hầu hết là ở các lớp trung gian. Kiến thức có khả năng giao tiếp giữa ngôn ngữ và bộ dữ liệu, đặc biệt khi ghi chú có liên quan đến các bộ huấn luyện và thử nghiệm. Các nghiên cứu của chúng tôi cung cấp cho các nhà khoa học nhận thức và ngọt.', 'bg': 'Човешките езици са пълни с метафорични изрази. Метафорите помагат на хората да разберат света, като свързват нови концепции и домейни с по-познати такива. Поради това се приема, че големите предварително обучени езикови модели (ПЛМ) кодират метафорични знания, полезни за системите на НЛП. В настоящата статия изследваме тази хипотеза за ПЛМ, като изследваме метафоричната информация в кодирането им и измерваме междуезичното и междусистемното обобщаване на тази информация. Представяме изследвания в множество метафорни набори от данни и на четири езика (английски, испански, руски и фарси). Нашите обширни експерименти предполагат, че контекстуалните представи в ПЛМ кодират метафорично знание и най-вече в средните им слоеве. Знанията могат да се прехвърлят между езиците и наборите от данни, особено когато анотацията е последователна в наборите от обучения и тестове. Нашите открития дават полезни прозрения както за когнитивните, така и за НЛП учени.', 'da': "Menneskesprog er fulde af metaforiske udtryk. Metaforer hjælper folk med at forstå verden ved at forbinde nye begreber og domæner til mere velkendte. Store prætrænede sprogmodeller (PLM'er) antages derfor at kode metaforisk viden nyttig for NLP-systemer. I denne artikel undersøger vi denne hypotese for PLM'er ved at undersøge metaforicitetsoplysninger i deres kodninger, og ved at måle den tværsprogede og tværsprogede datasæt generalisering af disse oplysninger. Vi præsenterer studier i flere metafordetektionsdatasæt og på fire sprog (dvs. engelsk, spansk, russisk og farsi). Vores omfattende eksperimenter tyder på, at kontekstuelle repræsentationer i PLM'er koder metaforisk viden, og mest i deres midterste lag. Viden kan overføres mellem sprog og datasæt, især når annotationen er ensartet på tværs af trænings- og testsæt. Vores resultater giver nyttig indsigt for både kognitive og NLP forskere.", 'nl': "Menselijke talen zitten vol metaforische uitdrukkingen. Metaforen helpen mensen de wereld te begrijpen door nieuwe concepten en domeinen te verbinden met meer bekende concepten en domeinen. Grote voorgetrainde taalmodellen (PLM's) worden daarom verondersteld metaforische kennis te coderen die nuttig is voor NLP-systemen. In dit artikel onderzoeken we deze hypothese voor PLM's, door metaforiciteitsinformatie in hun coderingen te onderzoeken, en door de cross-lingual en cross-dataset generalisatie van deze informatie te meten. We presenteren studies in meerdere metafordetectie datasets en in vier talen (Engels, Spaans, Russisch en Farsi). Onze uitgebreide experimenten suggereren dat contextuele representaties in PLM's metaforische kennis coderen, en meestal in hun middenlagen. De kennis is overdraagbaar tussen talen en datasets, vooral wanneer de annotatie consistent is tussen trainingen en testsets. Onze bevindingen geven nuttige inzichten voor zowel cognitieve als NLP wetenschappers.", 'id': 'Bahasa manusia penuh dengan ekspresi metafora. Metafora membantu orang memahami dunia dengan menghubungkan konsep dan domain baru dengan yang lebih akrab. Model bahasa besar yang dilatih-dilatih (PLM) dianggap sebagai pengetahuan metaforik yang berguna untuk sistem NLP. In this paper, we investigate this hypothesis for PLMs, by probing metaphoricity information in their encodings, and by measuring the cross-lingual and cross-dataset generalization of this information.  Kami mempersembahkan studi dalam beberapa set data deteksi metafora dan dalam empat bahasa (i.e., Inggris, Spanyol, Rusia, dan Farsi). Eksperimen ekstensif kami menyarankan bahwa representation kontekstual di PLM menggunakan pengetahuan metaforik, dan kebanyakan di lapisan tengah mereka. Pengetahuan dapat dipindahkan antara bahasa dan set data, terutama ketika anotasi konsisten di seluruh set latihan dan tes. Penemuan kami memberikan pandangan yang berguna untuk para ilmuwan kognitif dan NLP.', 'hr': 'Ljudski jezici su puni metaforskih izraza. Metafori pomažu ljudima da razumiju svijet povezivanjem novih koncepta i domena sa poznatijima. Stoga se pretpostavlja veliki predobučeni jezički modeli (PLMs) koji kodiraju metaforske znanje korisne za NLP sustave. U ovom papiru istražujemo ovu hipotezu za PLMs-e, ispitivajući metaforičnu informaciju u njihovim kodiranjima, i mjerenjem generalizacije prekograničnih i prekograničnih podataka ove informacije. Predstavljamo studije na višestrukim metaforama i na četiri jezika (tj. engleski, španjolski, ruski i farsi). Naši široki eksperimenti sugeriraju da kontekstualne predstave u PLMs-ovima kodiraju metaforske znanje, i uglavnom u srednjim slojevima. Znanje je prebacivano između jezika i podataka, posebno kada je annotacija u skladu s obukom i testiranjem. Naši nalazi pružaju pomoćni uvid i kognitivnim i NLP znanstvenicima.', 'de': 'Menschliche Sprachen sind voller metaphorischer Ausdrücke. Metaphern helfen Menschen, die Welt zu verstehen, indem sie neue Konzepte und Domänen mit vertrauteren verbinden. Es wird daher angenommen, dass große vortrainierte Sprachmodelle (PLMs) metaphorisches Wissen kodieren, das für NLP-Systeme nützlich ist. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir diese Hypothese für PLMs, indem wir Metapherninformationen in ihren Kodierungen untersuchen und die sprachübergreifende und datensatzübergreifende Verallgemeinerung dieser Informationen messen. Wir präsentieren Studien in mehreren Metaphernerkennungsdatensätzen und in vier Sprachen (Englisch, Spanisch, Russisch und Farsi). Unsere umfangreichen Experimente legen nahe, dass kontextuelle Repräsentationen in PLMs metaphorisches Wissen kodieren, und zwar meist in ihren mittleren Schichten. Das Wissen ist zwischen Sprachen und Datensätzen übertragbar, insbesondere wenn die Annotation über Trainings- und Testsets hinweg konsistent ist. Unsere Ergebnisse liefern hilfreiche Erkenntnisse sowohl für kognitive als auch für NLP-Wissenschaftler.', 'ko': '인류 언어에는 은유가 가득하다.은유는 새로운 개념과 영역을 더욱 익숙한 개념과 영역과 연결시켜 사람들이 세계를 이해하도록 돕는다.따라서 대형 사전 훈련된 언어모델(PLM)이 NLP 시스템에 유용한 은유 지식을 인코딩한다고 가정한다.본고에서 우리는 PLM 인코딩에서의 은유적인 정보를 탐색하고 이러한 정보를 측정하는 다중 언어와 다중 데이터 집합의 범위화를 통해 PLM의 이 가설을 연구한다.우리는 여러 개의 은유 검측 데이터 집합과 네 가지 언어(즉 영어, 스페인어, 러시아어, 페르시아어)에 대한 연구를 소개했다.우리의 대량의 실험은 PLM의 언어 환경 표징이 은유 지식을 인코딩한 것이 확실하고 주로 그 중간에 있음을 나타냈다.이러한 지식은 언어와 데이터 집합 사이를 옮길 수 있으며, 특히 주석이 훈련 집합과 테스트 집합 사이에서 일치할 때 옮길 수 있다.우리의 발견은 인지 과학자와 NLP 과학자에게 유익한 견해를 제공했다.', 'sw': 'Lugha za binadamu zimejaa hisia za mitazamo. Matumio yanawasaidia watu kuelewa dunia kwa kuunganisha dhana mpya na maeneo yanayofahamika zaidi. Mfano mkubwa wa lugha zilizofunzwa kabla (PLMs) kwa hiyo unadhaniwa kuingiza maarifa yanayofaa kwa mfumo wa NLP. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza nadharia hii kwa ajili ya chama cha PLMs, kwa kutafuta taarifa za ubunifu katika taarifa zao, na kwa kupima upatikanaji wa lugha mbalimbali na kutengeneza taarifa hizi. Tunatoa utafiti katika seti za taarifa mbalimbali za uchunguzi na kwa lugha nne (yaani Kiingereza, Kihispania, Urusi na Farsi). Majaribio yetu makubwa yanapendekeza kwamba uwakilishi wa zamani wa PLMs hujumuisha maarifa ya kibiashara, na zaidi katika vipande vyao vya kati. Ujuzi unabadilishwa kati ya lugha na seti za taarifa, hususani wakati taarifa hizo zinaendelea katika seti za mafunzo na majaribio. Matokeo yetu yanatoa mitazamo ya kusaidia kwa wanasayansi wanaojifahamu na wanachama wa NLP.', 'fa': 'زبان انسان پر از عبارت مثبتی است. متاثرات به مردم کمک می کنند که جهان را بفهمند با ارتباط نظریه های جدید و دامنه های جدید با کسانی که آشنا تر هستند. بنابراین مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبانی بزرگ (PLMs) به عنوان این فرض می\u200cشود که دانش\u200cهای متفافریک برای سیستم\u200cهای NLP مفید باشد. در این کاغذ، ما این فرضیه را برای PLMs تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، با تحقیق اطلاعات متفافرقیتی در رمزبندی\u200cهای آنها، و با اندازه\u200cگیری ژنرال\u200cسازی مجموعه\u200cهای ژنرال زبان و متفاوت داده\u200cهای این اطلاعات. ما مطالعه\u200cها را در مجموعه\u200cهای شناسایی داده\u200cهای متعفری و چهار زبان (یعنی انگلیسی، اسپانیایی، روسی و فارسی) نشان می\u200cدهیم. آزمایشات وسیع ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که نمایش\u200cهای متوسط در PLMs دانش\u200cهای متفافرقی، و بیشتر در طبقه\u200cهای متوسط آنها، رمزگذاری می\u200cکنند. دانش بین زبانها و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها قابل تغییر داده می\u200cشود، مخصوصا هنگامی که نوشته\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای تمرین و آزمایش موجود است. پیدا کردن ما برای دانشمندان شناخته و NLP به نظر کمک می دهد.', 'af': 'Mense tale is vol metaforiese uitdrukkings. Metafore help mense die wêreld verstaan deur nuwe konsepte en domeine te koppel aan meer bekend. Groot voorafgeleerde taal modele (PLMs) word dus aangeneem om metaforiese kennis te kodeer wat gebruik is vir NLP stelsels. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek hierdie hipotees vir PLMs deur metaforiteit inligting in hul kodering te probeer en deur die kruistale en kruis-datastel generellisering van hierdie inligting te maak. Ons stel studie in veelvuldige metaforopdekking datastelle en in vier tale (i.e. Engels, Spaanse, Russe en Farsi). Ons uitbreidige eksperimente stel voorstel dat contextual representations in PLMs encode metaforiese kennis, en meeste in hulle middelste laagte. Die kennis is oordragbaar tussen tale en datastelle, veral wanneer die annotasie bestaan word deur onderwerp en toets stel. Ons gevinde gee hulpbrekende insigs vir kognitiewe en NLP wetenskappers.', 'am': 'የሰው ቋንቋዎች መፍጠርን ሞልተዋል፡፡ ማተፊሮዎች አዲስ አሳብ እና ደብዳቤዎችን ለማወቅ ይረዳሉ፡፡ ከዚህ በፊት ተማሪ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች (PLMs) ለNLP ስርዓቶች የሚጠቅመው የሜትፎክሪካዊ እውቀት የኮድ ማድረግ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ ይህንን የPLMs hypothesis፣ የኢትዮጵያ መረጃቸውን በመግለጽ እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እና የዳታ-አካላትን በመለካት እናምርመራለን፡፡ በብዙ ምሳሌዎችን ማግኘት ዳታዎችን እና በአራቱ ቋንቋዎች (ምሳሌ ኢንጂልስፓኒሽ፣ ስፓኒሽ፣ ራሽኛ እና ፋርሲ) እናሳርጋለን፡፡ ብዙ ፈተናዎች በPLMs ውስጥ ያሉት የግንኙነት መልዕክቶች ማድረግ እና አብዛኛውም በመካከለኛው ደረጃዎች ውስጥ የሚቆጠሩ እውቀት ነው፡፡ እውቀቱ ቋንቋዎች እና ዳታዎችን መካከል ይለወጣል፤ ይልቁንም ማስታወቂያው በተጨማሪና በተፈተና ማሰናከል በተለየ ጊዜ ነው፡፡ ፍጥረታችን የሚያውቀው እና የNLP አዋቂዎች ጥቅረት ይሰጣል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մարդկային լեզուներն լի են փոխաբերական արտահայտումներով: Metaphors help people understand the world by connecting new concepts and domains to more familiar ones.  Այսպիսով, ենթադրվում է, որ մեծ նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները (PLM) կոդավորում են փոխաբերական գիտելիքներ, որոնք օգտակար են ՆԼՊ համակարգերի համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք այս հիպոթեզը PLM-ների համար, ուսումնասիրելով փոխաբերական ինֆորմացիան իրենց կոդավորումներում, և չափելով այս ինֆորմացիայի միջլեզվային և միջտվյալների ընդհանուր համակարգը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմաթիվ փոխաբերական հայտնաբերման տվյալների համակարգերի ուսումնասիրություններ և չորս լեզուներով (այսինքն՝ անգլերեն, իսպաներեն, ռուսական և ֆարսի լեզուներով): Մեր էքսպենսիվ փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ PLM-ի կոնտեքստոնալ ներկայացումները կոդավորում են փոխաբերական գիտելիքները, և հիմնականում միջին շերտերում: The knowledge is transferable between languages and datasets, especially when the annotation is consistent across training and testing sets.  Մեր հայտնաբերությունները օգտակար ընկալումներ են տալիս գիտնականների և ՆԼՊ-ի համար:', 'az': 'İnsan dilləri metaforik ifadələrlə doludur. Metaforlar insanlara dünyayı daha tanıdıqlarına yeni fikirləri və domeniləri bağlayıb anlamağa kömək edir. Buna görə də NLP sistemləri üçün faydalı metaforik bilgi kodlamaq üçün böyük öyrənmiş dil modelləri (PLMs) qəbul edilir. Bu kağızda, PLMs üçün bu hipotezi incidirik, onların kodlamalarında metaforik məlumatlarını incidirək, bu məlumatların çox dilli və çox-çox veri qurmasını ölçürək. Biz çoxlu metaforlar keşif veri qurularında və dörd dildə təhsil edirik. Bizim böyük təcrübələrimiz PLMs-lərdə müxtəlif təcrübələr metaforik bilgiləri kodlayır və çox orta düzlüklərində kodlayır. Bilim dillər ilə veri quruları arasında daşınabilir, əlbəttə ki, təhsil və sınama quruları arasında təhsil ediləndə. Bizim tapındıqlarımız bilimsel və NLP bilimsizləri üçün faydalanır.', 'bn': 'মানুষের ভাষা মেটোফিক্যাল ভাষায় পূর্ণ। মেটাফোর বিশ্বকে বুঝতে সাহায্য করে নতুন ধারণা এবং ডোমেইনের সাথে আরো পরিচিত লোকদের সাথে যোগাযোগ করে। এনএলপি সিস্টেমের জন্য বিশাল প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল (পিএলএমএস) এনকোড করার ধারণা করা হয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পিএলএমএসের এই হাইপিথিসির তথ্য অনুসন্ধান করি, তাদের কোডিং এর মাধ্যমে মেটোফিকারিক তথ্য প্রমাণ করে এবং এই তথ্যের ক্রস-ভাষা এবং ক্রাস্ আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি মেটাফার আবিষ্কারের ডাটাসেট এবং চার ভাষায় গবেষণা উপস্থাপন করি (যেমন ইংরেজি, স্প্যানিশ, রুশ এবং ফার্সি আমাদের বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষার পরামর্শ প্রস্তাব করে যে পিএলএমএসের সাথে প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে মেটি ভাষা এবং ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে জ্ঞান পরিবর্তনযোগ্য, বিশেষ করে যখন প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষা সেটের সাথে যুক্ত থাকে। Our findings give helpful insights for both cognitive and NLP scientists.', 'bs': 'Ljudski jezici su puni metaforskih izraza. Metafori pomažu ljudima da razumiju svijet povezujući nove koncepte i domene sa poznatijima. Stoga se pretpostavlja da će veliki predobučeni jezički modeli (PLMs) kodirati metaforske znanje korisne za NLP sisteme. U ovom papiru istražujemo ovu hipotezu za PLMs-e, probajući informacije o metaforiciji u njihovim kodiranjima, i mjerenjem generalizacije prekograničnih i prekograničnih podataka ove informacije. Predstavljamo studije na višestrukim metaforama i na četiri jezika (tj. engleski, španjolski, ruski i farsi). Naši široki eksperimenti sugeriraju da kontekstualne predstave u PLMs kodiraju metaforske znanje, i uglavnom u njihovim srednjim slojevima. Znanje je prebacivano između jezika i seta podataka, posebno kada je annotacija u skladu s obukom i testovima. Naši nalazi pružaju pomoćni uvid i kognitivnim i NLP naučnicima.', 'ca': "Les llengües humanes estan plenes d'expressions metàforiques. Les metàfores ajuden a la gent a entendre el món connectant nous conceptes i dominis amb conceptes més familiars. Per tant, es suposa que grans models de llenguatge pré-entrenats codifiquen coneixements metàforics útils per als sistemes NLP. En aquest paper, investigam aquesta hipòtesi per a MPL, investigant la informació de la metàfora en les seves codificacions i mesurant la generalització del conjunt de dades translingües i cruzades d'aquesta informació. Presentam estudis en múltiples conjunts de dades de detecció de metàfores i en quatre llengües (és a dir, anglès, espanyol, rus i farsi). Our extensive experiments suggest that contextual representations in PLMs do encode metaphorical knowledge, and mostly in their middle layers.  El coneixement és transferible entre llengües i conjunts de dades, especialment quan la anotació és consistent en conjunts d'entrenament i prova. Our findings give helpful insights for both cognitive and NLP scientists.", 'cs': 'Lidské jazyky jsou plné metaforických výrazů. Metafory pomáhají lidem porozumět světu propojením nových konceptů a domén se známějšími. Proto se předpokládá, že velké předškolené jazykové modely (PLM) kódují metaforické znalosti užitečné pro NLP systémy. V tomto článku zkoumáme tuto hypotézu pro PLM, zkoumáním metaforických informací v jejich kódování a měřením cross-jazyčné a cross-datové zobecnění těchto informací. Předkládáme studie v mnoha datových sadách detekce metafor a ve čtyřech jazycích (angličtině, španělštině, ruštině a farštině). Naše rozsáhlé experimenty naznačují, že kontextové reprezentace v PLM kódují metaforické znalosti, a to většinou ve středních vrstvách. Znalosti jsou přenositelné mezi jazyky a datovými sadami, zejména pokud je anotace konzistentní napříč školeními a testovacími sadami. Naše zjištění poskytují užitečné poznatky jak pro kognitivní, tak pro NLP vědce.', 'tr': "Adamlar dilleri metaforik ifadelerden doly. Metaforler adamlara dünýäni täze düşünjeler we domaýlary tanyş adamlara baglaşyp kömekleýär. Ullakan öňünden eğlenen dil nusgalary (PLMs) NLP sistemalary üçin ulanylan metaforik bilgi kodlemek üçin pikir edilýär. Bu kagyzda, PLM üçin bu hypotezi barlap, olaryň ködlemelerinde metaforik maglumatyny barlap, we bu maglumatyň cross-dilli we cross-dataset döredilişini ölçüp ýöredik. Biz birnäçe metafora tanyş veri setirlerinde we dört dilde öwrenmeleri görkeýäris Bizim çöplü deneylerimiz PLM'lerde orta katlarda görüntüleri metaforik bilgi kodlaýar ve köplenç orta katlarda kodlaýar. Bilim diller we veri setirler arasynda geçirilýär, ýöne-de nähili täzelikler eğitim we testim setirleri arasynda duryp barýar. Tapdyklarymyz hem bilim adamlarymyz hem bilim adamlarymyz üçin kömek görüp biler.", 'sq': 'Gjuhat njerëzore janë plot me shprehje metaforike. Metaforat ndihmojnë njerëzit të kuptojnë botën duke lidhur koncepte dhe domena të reja me ato më të njohura. Modelet e mëdha të paratrajnuara gjuhësh (PLM) prandaj supozohen të kodojnë njohuritë metaforike të dobishme për sistemet NLP. Në këtë letër, ne hetojmë këtë hipotezë për PLMs, duke hetuar informacionin e metaforisë në kodifikimet e tyre dhe duke matur gjeneralizacionin e këtij informacioni ndërgjuhësor dhe ndër të dhënat. Ne paraqesim studime në disa grupe të dhënash për zbulimin e metaforave dhe në katër gjuhë (pra, anglisht, spanjoll, rusë dhe farsi). Eksperimentet tona të gjerë sugjerojnë se përfaqësimet kontekstuale në PLM kodojnë njohuritë metaforike dhe kryesisht në nivelet e tyre të mesme. Njohja është e transferueshme midis gjuhëve dhe grupeve të dhënash, veçanërisht kur anotacioni është konsistent nëpërmjet grupeve të trajnimit dhe testimit. Zbulimet tona japin kuptime të dobishme si për shkencëtarët e njohur ashtu edhe për NLP.', 'et': 'Inimkeeled on täis metafoorseid väljendeid. Metafoorid aitavad inimestel maailma mõista, ühendades uued kontseptsioonid ja domeenid tuttavamate omadega. Seetõttu eeldatakse, et suured eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudelid kodeerivad NLP süsteemide jaoks kasulikke metafoorseid teadmisi. Käesolevas töös uurime seda hüpoteesi PLM-ide kohta, proovides metafoorset infot nende kodeeringutes ning mõõtes selle informatsiooni keeleülest ja andmetevahelist üldistamist. Esitleme uuringuid mitme metafoori tuvastamise andmekogumites ja neljas keeles (inglise, hispaania, vene ja farsi keeles). Meie ulatuslikud eksperimendid näitavad, et kontekstuaalsed kujutised PLMs kodeerivad metafoorseid teadmisi ja peamiselt nende keskmistes kihtides. Teadmised on keelte ja andmekogumite vahel ülekantavad, eriti kui märkused on koolitus- ja katsekogumite vahel ühtlased. Meie leiud annavad kasulikke ülevaateid nii kognitiivsetele kui ka NLP teadlastele.', 'fi': 'Ihmiskielet ovat täynnä metaforisia ilmaisuja. Metaforit auttavat ihmisiä ymmärtämään maailmaa yhdistämällä uusia käsitteitä ja toimialueita tutumpiin. Suurten esikoulutettujen kielimallien (PLM) oletetaan siis koodaavan NLP-järjestelmissä hyödyllistä metaforista tietoa. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme tätä hypoteesia PLM:ille tutkimalla metaforisia tietoja niiden koodauksissa ja mittaamalla tämän tiedon monikielistä ja ristikkäistä yleistymistä. Esitämme tutkimuksia useilla metaforien havaitsemisen aineistoilla ja neljällä kielellä (englanti, espanja, venäjä ja farsi). Laajat kokeemme viittaavat siihen, että kontekstuaaliset esitykset PLM:ssä koodaavat metaforista tietoa, ja enimmäkseen niiden keskikerroksissa. Tieto on siirrettävissä kielten ja tietoaineistojen välillä erityisesti silloin, kun merkinnät ovat yhdenmukaisia koulutus- ja testaussarjojen välillä. Tuloksemme antavat hyödyllistä tietoa sekä kognitiivisille että NLP-tutkijoille.', 'jv': 'Jenengan wong ki bobrong metaphor metaphor luwih ngéwangi perbudhakan kanggo ngerasai dunya iki dadi mèh pawaran karo hal-hal sing luwih apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang paper iki, kéné ujarane suputes iki kanggo PLMs, Ngawe ngubah informasi metaphoriki kanggo koder, lan nganggep kuwi ngger perusahaan langgambar lan karo-dataset Generalizasi informasi iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh stiro karo akeh metaphor. Rasane Pangan Bilih sedhaya ing pancene mruput karo akeh basa karo dataset, sithik karo awak dhéwé tau sinau mruput karo perasaane seneng nggawe layar lan ujian. Ndheke awakdhéwé kuwi nglanggar bantuan kanggo alih-alih koyok ngono awakdhéwé NLP.', 'ha': "Harsunan mutum sun cika da magana mai motsi. Metafori na taimakon mutane su fahimta duniya da sunã haɗa zato-zaɓen na'ura zuwa mafiya sani. @ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, Munã tambayi wannan nadarin na PLM, game da jarraba data na metaforikati a cikin kodingan, kuma da kafarin sassaukarwa na-lugha'ar-ƙaranci da data-na-tarakinsa. Tuna halatar da karatun cikin tsarin bayani-bayani masu yawa da harshe huɗu (misali, Ingiriya, Kispanish, Ruushi, da Farsi). Kayan jarrabõyinmu masu shimfiɗa sun ƙayyade cẽwa masu halartawa a cikin PLM, suna kodi da ilmi na metafo, kuma mafi yawansu a cikin masallatan tsakaninsu. Sann za'a shige a tsakanin harshen da mutane, da hususanci idan an haɗa shirin da ke sami cikin tsarin mai amfani da jarraba. FantayinMu na bã da gannai masu amfani ga masu sami da sami na NLP.", 'sk': 'Človeški jeziki so polni metaforičnih izrazov. Metafore pomagajo ljudem razumeti svet s povezovanjem novih konceptov in domen z bolj znanimi. Veliki predhodno usposobljeni jezikovni modeli (PLM) zato naj bi kodirali metaforično znanje, ki je koristno za sisteme NLP. V prispevku raziskujemo to hipotezo za PLM s prodiranjem metaforičnih informacij v njihovih kodiranjih ter z merjenjem medjezične in medpodatkovne generalizacije teh informacij. Predstavljamo študije v zbirkah podatkov o odkrivanju več metaforov in v štirih jezikih (angleščini, španščini, ruščini in farščini). Naši obsežni eksperimenti kažejo, da kontekstualne reprezentacije v PLM kodirajo metaforično znanje, predvsem v srednjih plasteh. Znanje je prenosljivo med jeziki in nabori podatkov, zlasti če je opomba skladna med nabori usposabljanja in testiranja. Naše ugotovitve dajejo koristne vpoglede tako znanstvenikom kot znanstvenikom NLP.', 'he': 'שפות אנושיות מלאות בבטאות מטאפוריות. מטאפורות עוזרות לאנשים להבין את העולם על ידי חיבור מושגים חדשים ותחומים יותר מוכרים. דוגמני שפה גדולים מאומנים מראש (PLMs) נניחים לכן לקוד ידע מטאפורי שימושי למערכות NLP. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים את ההיפתוזיה הזאת עבור PLMs, על ידי חקירה מידע מטאפוריות בקוד שלהם, ובידי למדוד את הגנרליזציה של המידע הזה אנו מציגים מחקרים באמצעות מידע זיהוי מטאפורות רבות ובארבעה שפות (כלומר, אנגלית, ספרדית, רוסית ופרסית). הניסויים המרחבים שלנו מצביעים כי מייצגים קונטקסטיים ב PLMs עושים קוד ידע מטאפורי, וברוב בשכבות האמצעיות שלהם. הידע ניתן להעביר בין שפות לבין קבוצות נתונים, במיוחד כאשר ההערכה תואמת בין קבוצות אימונים ובדיקות. הממצאים שלנו נותנים תובנות מועילות גם למדענים קוגניטיביים וגם למדענים NLP.', 'bo': 'མི་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་རིགས་འདི་ལ་མཚུངས་བསྡུར་བའི་གསལ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཐའ་དབུགས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མི་མང་གིས་འཛམ་གླིང་འདི་རྟོགས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཆོག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་གྲངས་སྔོན་གྲངས་འཛིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ(PLMs)དག་དེ་ནས་NLP མ་ལག་ལ་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གསལ་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་ཆེན་ In this paper, we investigate this hypothesis for PLMs, by probing metaphoricity information in their encodings, and by measuring the cross-lingual and cross-dataset generalization of this information. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཆེན་དག་གིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྣང་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ནི་ སྐད་ཡིག་དང་གནད་སྡུད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཚོའི་བར་སྐབས་སྐུལ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། དམིགས་བསལ་སྐབས་སུ། ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་། སྦྲེལ་རིག་གི་ཚན་རིག་པོ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྟོགས་པའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Pyramid-', 'ar': 'تحريض شجرة الرأي المنفصل لتحليل المشاعر القائم على الجانب', 'fr': "Induction d'un arbre d'opinion discret pour l'analyse du sentiment basée sur les aspects", 'pt': 'Indução de Árvore de Opinião Discreta para Análise de Sentimentos Baseada em Aspectos', 'es': 'Inducción de árboles de opinión discretos para el análisis de sentimientos basado en aspectos', 'ja': 'アスペクトベースの感情分析のための離散オピニオンツリー誘導', 'zh': '所以散意归之', 'hi': 'पहलू-आधारित भावना विश्लेषण के लिए असतत राय ट्री प्रेरण', 'ru': 'Дискретная индукция дерева мнений для анализа настроений на основе аспектов', 'ga': 'Ionduchtú Crann Tuairime Scoite le haghaidh Anailís Mothúchán Bunaithe ar Ghné', 'ka': 'დისკრეტური განსახულების ხე ინდექცია აპექტიკური განსახულების ანალიზაციისთვის', 'hu': 'Diszkrét véleményfa indukció aspektus alapú érzelmek elemzéséhez', 'el': 'Διακριτική επαγωγή δέντρου γνώμης για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων με βάση την πτυχή', 'it': "Induzione dell'albero di opinione discreta per l'analisi dei sentimenti basata sugli aspetti", 'lt': 'Diskrečioji nuomonė – medžio indukcija siekiant analizuoti jausmą pagal aspektus', 'kk': 'Дискретті анықтау бұтақ индукциясы аспекті негіздеген сезімді анализ', 'mk': 'Дискретна индукција на дрво на мислење за анализа на чувства базирана на аспект', 'ms': 'Induksi Pepohon Opsyen Diskret untuk Analisi Sentimen Berasas Aspek', 'ml': 'ആസ്പെക്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം', 'mt': 'Opinjoni Diskreta Induzzjoni tas-Siġar għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment ibbażata fuq l-Aspett', 'mn': 'Дискретик ойлголтын Tree Induction for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'no': 'Discrete Opinion Tree Induction for aspektbasert sentralanalyse', 'pl': 'Dyskretna indukcja drzewa opinii dla analizy sentymentów opartej na aspektach', 'sr': 'Discrete Opinion Tree Induction for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'ro': 'Inducția discretă a arborelui de opinie pentru analiza sentimentelor bazată pe aspecte', 'sv': 'Diskret åsiktsträdinduktion för aspektbaserad känselanalys', 'so': 'Ka qeyb-qaadashada geedka firaaqada ah', 'ta': 'பார்வை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள உணர்வு விளக்கத்திற்கான துவக்க மரத்தை வெளியேறு', 'ur': 'دیسکریٹ نظر کے درخت انڈاکٹینٹ', 'si': 'ස්පෙක්ට් අධාරිත සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විස්තර විස්තර', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trình đầu tư nhạy cảm phân loại', 'bg': 'Дискретна индукция на дървото на мненията за анализ на сентимента въз основа на аспектите', 'hr': 'Diskretno mišljenje Indukcija drveta za analizu osjetljivosti na osnovu aspekta', 'nl': 'Discrete opinieboom inductie voor aspect-based sentiment analyse', 'da': 'Diskret meningstræinduktion til aspektbaseret følelsesanalyse', 'id': 'Diskret Opinion Tree Induction for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'de': 'Diskrete Meinungsbauminduktion für aspektbasierte Stimmungsanalyse', 'fa': 'تأثیر درخت نظر مخصوص برای تحلیل احساسات بر روی نظر', 'sw': 'Kuondoa Ujenzi wa Mti wa Utafiti kwa Uchambuzi wa Wakati wa Matokeo', 'ko': '방면의 정서 분석에 기초한 이산 의견 트리 귀납법', 'tr': 'Aspect tabanly Sentiýat Analyzasy üçin diskrete Aýry Aýry Gaýşartma', 'af': 'Diskrete Opdrag Boom Induksie vir Aspekte-gebaseerde Sentiment Analisie', 'sq': 'Opinioni diskret Indukcioni i pemës për Analizën e Sentimenteve bazuar në aspekte', 'am': 'Discrete Opinion Tree Induction for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'hy': 'Դիսկրետ կարծիքի ծառի ինդուկցիան հարցերի հիմնված զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար', 'bn': 'Discrete Opinion Tree Induction for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'bs': 'Discrete Opinion Tree Induction for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'ca': "Inducció discreta d'arbres per a l'anàlisi de sentiments basat en aspectes", 'az': 'Aspect-tabanlı Sentiment Analizi üçün Discrete Opinion Tree Induction', 'cs': 'Diskrétní indukce stromu názoru pro aspektovou analýzu sentimentů', 'et': 'Diskreetne arvamuspuu induktsioon aspektipõhiseks tunnete analüüsiks', 'fi': 'Discrete Opinion Tree Induction for Aspect-based Sentiment Analysis', 'jv': 'Diskretni Atomon Terapa Itungan kanggo Aspect-basa Sentiment', 'sk': 'Diskretna indukcija drevesa mnenj za analizo čustva, ki temelji na vidikih', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'דיבור דיסקרטי עצים עבור ניתוח רגשות מבוסס על האפקטים', 'bo': 'སྣང་ཚུལ་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་གསལ་བའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'Transformer-based language models such as BERT (CITATION) have achieved the state-of-the-art performance on various NLP tasks, but are computationally prohibitive. A recent line of works use various heuristics to successively shorten sequence length while transforming tokens through encoders, in tasks such as classification and ranking that require a single token embedding for prediction.We present a novel solution to this problem, called Pyramid-BERT where we replace previously used heuristics with a core-set based token selection method justified by theoretical results. The core-set based token selection technique allows us to avoid expensive pre-training, gives a space-efficient fine tuning, and thus makes it suitable to handle longer sequence lengths. We provide extensive experiments establishing advantages of pyramid BERT over several baselines and existing works on the GLUE benchmarks and Long Range Arena (CITATION) datasets.', 'ar': 'تم استخدام أشجار التبعية بشكل مكثف مع الشبكات العصبية للرسم البياني لتصنيف المشاعر القائمة على الجانب. على الرغم من فعاليتها ، إلا أن هذه الأساليب تعتمد على محللات التبعية الخارجية ، والتي يمكن أن تكون غير متوفرة للغات منخفضة الموارد أو تؤدي بشكل أسوأ في المجالات منخفضة الموارد. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، لم يتم تحسين أشجار التبعية أيضًا لتصنيف المشاعر المستند إلى الجانب. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذج شجرة رأي كامن خاص بالجانب ومحايد للغة كهيكل بديل لأشجار التبعية الصريحة. لتسهيل تعلم المتغيرات الكامنة الهيكلية المعقدة ، نقوم ببناء صلة بين درجات الانتباه من جانب إلى سياق والمسافات النحوية ، مما يحفز الأشجار من درجات الانتباه. تظهر النتائج على ستة معايير للغة الإنجليزية ومجموعة بيانات صينية واحدة أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يحقق أداءً تنافسيًا وقابلية للتفسير.', 'es': 'Los árboles de dependencias se han utilizado intensamente con redes neuronales gráficas para la clasificación de sentimientos basada en aspectos. Aunque son eficaces, estos métodos se basan en analizadores de dependencias externos, que pueden no estar disponibles para lenguajes de bajos recursos o tener un peor rendimiento en dominios de bajos recursos. Además, los árboles de dependencias tampoco están optimizados para la clasificación de opiniones basada en aspectos. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo de árbol de opinión latente discreto específico de un aspecto e independiente del lenguaje como una estructura alternativa a los árboles de dependencia explícita. Para facilitar el aprendizaje de variables latentes estructuradas complicadas, construimos una conexión entre las puntuaciones de atención de aspecto a contexto y las distancias sintácticas, induciendo árboles a partir de las puntuaciones de atención. Los resultados de seis puntos de referencia en inglés y un conjunto de datos chino muestran que nuestro modelo puede lograr un rendimiento competitivo y una interpretabilidad.', 'pt': 'Árvores de dependência têm sido intensamente usadas com redes neurais de grafos para classificação de sentimentos baseada em aspectos. Embora sejam eficazes, esses métodos dependem de analisadores de dependência externa, que podem estar indisponíveis para linguagens de poucos recursos ou ter um desempenho pior em domínios de poucos recursos. Além disso, as árvores de dependência também não são otimizadas para classificação de sentimento baseada em aspecto. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo de árvore de opinião latente discreta específico de aspecto e agnóstico de linguagem como uma estrutura alternativa para árvores de dependência explícitas. Para facilitar o aprendizado de variáveis latentes estruturadas complicadas, construímos uma conexão entre pontuações de atenção aspecto-contexto e distâncias sintáticas, induzindo árvores a partir das pontuações de atenção. Os resultados em seis benchmarks ingleses e um conjunto de dados chinês mostram que nosso modelo pode alcançar desempenho e interpretabilidade competitivos.', 'fr': "Les arbres de dépendance ont été intensivement utilisés avec les réseaux neuronaux de graphes pour la classification des sentiments basée sur les aspects. Bien qu'efficaces, ces méthodes reposent sur des analyseurs de dépendance externes, qui peuvent ne pas être disponibles pour les langues à faibles ressources ou moins performants dans les domaines à faibles ressources. De plus, les arbres de dépendance ne sont pas optimisés pour la classification des sentiments basée sur les aspects. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle d'arbre d'opinion latente discret spécifique à un aspect et indépendant de la langue comme structure alternative aux arbres de dépendance explicites. Pour faciliter l'apprentissage de variables latentes structurées complexes, nous établissons un lien entre les scores d'attention aspect et contexte et les distances syntaxiques, en induisant des arbres à partir des scores d'attention. Les résultats de six tests de référence en anglais et d'un ensemble de données chinois montrent que notre modèle peut atteindre des performances et une interprétabilité compétitives.", 'zh': '赖树已与图神经网络密用,施于情类。 虽有效于下,而外恃于解析器,解析器于下不可用,或下资源域中性差。 此外,恃树无针于情类优化。 本文中,发一特定于语言无关离合,为显式依树代构。 以便学杂结构化潜于变量,上下文意分数句法相去为一接,诱树于意力分数之中。 六英文基准与一中文数据集之的结果表明,吾模可以成竞争力性可解释性。', 'ja': '依存性ツリーは、アスペクトベースのセンチメント分類のためにグラフニューラルネットワークとともに集中的に使用されてきた。効果的であるが、そのような方法は、外部依存パーサーに依存しており、これは、低リソース言語では利用できない可能性があるか、または低リソースドメインではより悪いパフォーマンスを発揮する可能性がある。さらに、依存性ツリーもアスペクトベースのセンチメント分類のために最適化されていません。本稿では、明示的依存木の代替構造として、態様固有かつ言語非依存的な離散潜在意見ツリーモデルを提案する。複雑な構造化された潜在変数の学習を容易にするために、アスペクト間の注意スコアと構文距離との間の接続を構築し、注意スコアから木を誘導します。6つの英語ベンチマークと1つの中国語データセットの結果は、当社のモデルが競争力のあるパフォーマンスと解釈可能性を達成できることを示しています。', 'ru': 'Деревья зависимостей интенсивно использовались с графовыми нейронными сетями для классификации настроений на основе аспектов. Хотя такие методы эффективны, они опираются на внешние парсеры зависимостей, которые могут быть недоступны для языков с низким уровнем ресурсов или работать хуже в доменах с низким уровнем ресурсов. Кроме того, деревья зависимостей также не оптимизированы для классификации настроений на основе аспектов. В этой статье мы предлагаем специфическую для аспекта и диагностическую по языку дискретную модель дерева скрытых мнений в качестве альтернативы структуре явного дерева зависимостей. Чтобы облегчить изучение сложных структурированных скрытых переменных, мы строим связь между оценками внимания от аспекта к контексту и синтаксическими расстояниями, вызывая деревья из оценок внимания. Результаты по шести английским эталонам и одному китайскому набору данных показывают, что наша модель может  достичь конкурентоспособной производительности и интерпретируемости.', 'hi': 'निर्भरता के पेड़ों को पहलू-आधारित भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए ग्राफ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ गहन रूप से उपयोग किया गया है। हालांकि प्रभावी होने के नाते, इस तरह के तरीके बाहरी निर्भरता पार्सर पर निर्भर करते हैं, जो कम-संसाधन भाषाओं के लिए अनुपलब्ध हो सकते हैं या कम-संसाधन डोमेन में बदतर प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं। इसके अलावा, निर्भरता के पेड़ भी पहलू-आधारित भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए अनुकूलित नहीं हैं। इस पेपर में, हम स्पष्ट निर्भरता पेड़ों के लिए एक वैकल्पिक संरचना के रूप में एक पहलू-विशिष्ट और भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी असतत अव्यक्त राय पेड़ मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। जटिल संरचित अव्यक्त चर के सीखने को आसान बनाने के लिए, हम पहलू-से-संदर्भ ध्यान स्कोर और वाक्यात्मक दूरी के बीच एक संबंध बनाते हैं, जो ध्यान स्कोर से पेड़ों को प्रेरित करते हैं। छह अंग्रेजी बेंचमार्क और एक चीनी डेटासेट पर परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन और व्याख्याक्षमता प्राप्त कर सकता है।', 'ga': 'Baineadh úsáid dhian as crainn spleáchais le líonraí néaracha graif chun meon bunaithe ar ghnéithe a rangú. Cé go bhfuil a leithéid de mhodhanna éifeachtach, bíonn siad ag brath ar pharsálaithe spleáchais sheachtracha, rud nach féidir a bheith ar fáil do theangacha íseal-acmhainne nó a éiríonn níos measa i bhfearainn íseal-acmhainne. Ina theannta sin, níl crainn spleáchais optamaithe le haghaidh aicmiú meon bunaithe ar ghnéithe. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla crann tuairime folaigh scoite gné-sonrach agus teanga-agnostic mar struchtúr eile seachas crainn spleáchais fhollasach. Chun foghlaim na n-athróg struchtúrtha casta folaigh a éascú, déanaimid nasc idir scóir aird ó ghné go comhthéacs agus achair chomhréire, rud a spreagann crainn ó na scóir aird. Léiríonn torthaí ar shé thagarmharc Béarla agus tacar sonraí Síneach amháin gur féidir lenár múnla feidhmíocht iomaíoch agus inléirmhíniú a bhaint amach.', 'el': 'Τα δέντρα εξάρτησης έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί εντατικά με νευρωνικά δίκτυα γραφήματος για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων βάσει πτυχών. Αν και είναι αποτελεσματικές, αυτές οι μέθοδοι βασίζονται σε εξωτερικούς αναλυτές εξάρτησης, οι οποίοι μπορεί να μην είναι διαθέσιμοι για γλώσσες χαμηλού πόρου ή να αποδίδουν χειρότερα σε τομείς χαμηλού πόρου. Επιπλέον, τα δέντρα εξάρτησης δεν είναι επίσης βελτιστοποιημένα για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων βάσει πτυχών. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο διακριτού λανθάνοντος δέντρου γνώμης ειδικά για την πτυχή και τη γλώσσα, ως εναλλακτική δομή των ρητών δέντρων εξάρτησης. Για να διευκολύνουμε την εκμάθηση περίπλοκων δομημένων λανθάνοντων μεταβλητών, χτίζουμε μια σύνδεση μεταξύ των βαθμολογιών προσοχής πτυχής-πλαισίου και των συντακτικών αποστάσεων, προκαλώντας δέντρα από τις βαθμολογίες προσοχής. Τα αποτελέσματα σε έξι αγγλικά κριτήρια αναφοράς και ένα κινεζικό σύνολο δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να επιτύχει ανταγωνιστική απόδοση και ερμηνεία.', 'hu': 'A függőségi fákat intenzíven használták gráf neurális hálózatokkal aspektusalapú hangulatosztályozáshoz. Bár hatékonyak, ezek a módszerek külső függőség-elemzőkre támaszkodnak, amelyek nem elérhetőek az alacsony erőforrású nyelvek esetében, vagy rosszabbak lehetnek az alacsony erőforrású tartományok esetében. Ezenkívül a függőségi fákat sem optimalizálták aspektusalapú hangulatosztályozásra. Jelen tanulmányban egy aspektuspecifikus és nyelv-agnosztikus diszkrét látens véleményfa modellt javasolunk, mint alternatív struktúrát az explicit függőségi fák számára. A bonyolult strukturált látens változók tanulásának megkönnyítése érdekében kapcsolatot építünk ki aspektus-kontextus figyelempontszámok és szintaktikus távolságok között, ami a figyelempontszámokból fákat idéz elő. Hat angol referenciaérték és egy kínai adatkészlet eredményei azt mutatják, hogy modellünk versenyképes teljesítményt és értelmezhetőséget érhet el.', 'ka': 'დამხოლოების ხელები ინტენტიგურად გამოყენებულია ნეიროლური ქსელებით აპექტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის. მაგრამ ეფექტიური იყო, ასეთი მეტოვები გადარჩენებულია გარეშესახებ პანსერაციისთვის, რომელიც შეუძლებელია გარეშესახებ ცოტა რესურსის ენათებისთვის ან გარეშე დამატებით, დამხოლოდ დამხოლოდ სენტიმენტების კლასიფიკაციაში ასევე აპტიმიზებულია. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ აპექტიკური და ენის-ადნოსტიკური დისკრეტური მოდულის მოდელია, როგორც ალტერტური სტრუქტურა გამოსახულებელი განსახულებელობის ხელებისთვის. შემდეგ კომპლექტურული სტრუქტურული ცვლილების შესწავლას, ჩვენ აპექტიკური კონტექტიკური მონაცემების და სინტექტიკური განტოლებების შესახებ დავწყებთ, აღმოჩენის მონაცემებ შვიდი ანგლისური ბენქმარი და ერთი ჩინეთის მონაცემების სექტის შესაძლებლობა ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებლობა კონპექციური გამოყენება და ინტერპულაცია.', 'it': "Gli alberi di dipendenza sono stati utilizzati intensamente con le reti neurali grafiche per la classificazione del sentiment basata sugli aspetti. Sebbene siano efficaci, tali metodi si basano su parser di dipendenza esterni, che possono non essere disponibili per i linguaggi a basso contenuto di risorse o avere prestazioni peggiori in domini a basso contenuto di risorse. Inoltre, gli alberi delle dipendenze non sono ottimizzati per la classificazione del sentiment basata sugli aspetti. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello di albero di opinione latente discreto, specifico per l'aspetto e agnostico per il linguaggio come struttura alternativa agli alberi di dipendenza esplicita. Per facilitare l'apprendimento di complicate variabili latenti strutturate, costruiamo una connessione tra punteggi di attenzione aspetto-contesto e distanze sintattiche, inducendo alberi dai punteggi di attenzione. I risultati ottenuti su sei benchmark inglesi e un dataset cinese dimostrano che il nostro modello può raggiungere prestazioni competitive e interpretabilità.", 'lt': 'Priklausomybės medžiai buvo intensyviai naudojami su grafiniais nerviniais tinklais, kad būtų galima klasifikuoti jausmą pagal aspektus. Though being effective, such methods rely on external dependency parsers, which can be unavailable for low-resource languages or perform worse in low-resource domains.  Be to, priklausomybės medžiai taip pat nėra optimizuojami pagal aspektus grindžiamai jausmų klasifikacijai. Šiame dokumente siūlome konkretų aspektą ir kalbos-agnostinį diskretų latentinių nuomonių medžių model į kaip alternatyvą aiškiai priklausomų medžių struktūrai. Siekiant palengvinti sudėtingų struktūrizuotų latentinių kintamųjų mokymąsi, mes sukuriame ryšį tarp aspekto ir konteksto dėmesio taškų ir sintaktinių atstumų, skatindami medžius iš dėmesio taškų. Rezultatai, gauti pagal šešis anglų lyginamuosius rodiklius ir vieną Kinijos duomenų rinkinį, rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali pasiekti konkurencinį veiksmingumą ir aiškinamumą.', 'mk': 'Дрвите на зависност се интензивно употребени со графички нервни мрежи за класификација на чувства базирани на аспектот. Иако тие се ефикасни, ваквите методи се зависат од надворешни анализатори на зависност, кои можат да бидат недостигни за јазици со ниски ресурси или да бидат полоши во домените со ниски ресурси. Покрај тоа, дрвјата на зависност, исто така, не се оптимизирани за класификација на чувства базирана на аспектот. Во овој весник, предложуваме специфичен аспект и јазик-агностички дискретно лантен модел на дрво на мислење како алтернативна структура за експлицитни дрва на зависност. За да го олесниме научувањето на комплицираните структурирани тајни променливи, градиме врска помеѓу резултатите на вниманието од аспект до контекст и синтактичките далечини, индукционирајќи дрва од резултатите на вниманието. Резултатите на шест англиски споредби и еден кинески податок покажуваат дека нашиот модел може да постигне конкурентна перформанса и интерпретабилност.', 'kk': 'Тәуелсіздік ағаштары аспекті негізделген сезімдер үшін графикалық невралдық желілерден қолданылады. Эффективті болса да, бұл әдістер сыртқы тәуелсіздік талдаушыларына тәуелді, олар төменгі ресурс тілдері үшін қол жеткізбейді немесе төменгі ресурс домендерінде тәуелсіз. Қосымша, тәуелсіздік ағаштары қарапайым көздерді бағыттау үшін оптимизацияланмайды. Бұл қағазда, бұл аспекті арнаулы және тілді агностикалық қатынас ағаш үлгісін түсінікті тәуелдік ағаштардың альтернативті құрылғысы ретінде таңдаймыз. Түрлі құрылған келесі айнымалыларды оқыту үшін, біз аспекті-контекстік нүктелер мен синтактикалық қашықтар арасындағы байланыс құрып, нақышты нүктелерден ағаштарды құрып жатырмыз. Алты ағылшын тілінің белгісінің нәтижесі және бір қытайлық деректер жинағы біздің моделіміздің жарықтығы және түсініктемесін жеткізуге болады.', 'ms': 'Pohon dependensi telah digunakan secara intens dengan rangkaian saraf graf untuk klasifikasi sentimen berdasarkan aspek. Walaupun berkesan, kaedah tersebut bergantung pada penghurai dependensi luaran, yang boleh tidak tersedia untuk bahasa sumber rendah atau melakukan lebih buruk dalam domain sumber rendah. Selain itu, pokok dependensi juga tidak optimum untuk klasifikasi sentimen berdasarkan aspek. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model pepohon pendapat tertutup yang spesifik aspek dan agnostik bahasa sebagai struktur alternatif untuk pepohon dependensi yang jelas. Untuk memudahkan pembelajaran pembolehubah tersembunyi struktur rumit, kita membina sambungan antara skor perhatian aspek-ke-konteks dan jarak sintaktik, mengakibatkan pokok dari skor perhatian. Hasil pada enam tanda referensi Inggeris dan satu set data Cina menunjukkan bahawa model kita boleh mencapai prestasi kompetitif dan keterlaluan.', 'mn': 'Харин хамааралтай мод нүүрстөрөгчийн мэдрэмжүүдийн хуваалтын график мэдрэмжүүдийн сүлжээнд маш их хэрэглэгдсэн. Хэдийгээр үр дүнтэй ч гэсэн, эдгээр арга зам нь гадаад хамааралтай хуваалцагчид дээр байдаг. Энэ нь бага баялаг боловсролын хэлний тулд ашиггүй, эсвэл бага боловсролын дотор илүү муу байж болно. Түүнчлэн, хамааралтай мод мөн асуудлын үндсэн мэдрэмжүүдийн хуваалтын тулд хамааралтай байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний тодорхойлолтой, агностикийн соронзон ойлголтын модны загварыг тодорхойлолтой хамааралтай модны өөр бүтэц гэж санал болгож байна. Ингээд төвөгтэй бүтээгдэхүүн өөрчлөлтийг амархан суралцахын тулд бид анхаарлын анхаарлын тоо болон синтактикийн зай хоорондоо холбоотой, анхаарлын тоонуудын мод боловсруулдаг. Англи хэлний зургаан багц болон нэг Хятад өгөгдлийн багц нь бидний загвар нь өрсөлдөөний үйл ажиллагаа болон түүхийн чадварыг хүргэж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ml': 'ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റുകളുമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പുറത്തുള്ള ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസര്\u200dസിനെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന രീതികളാണെങ്കിലും, അത് കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് ലഭ്യമല്ല അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കുറഞ In addition, dependency trees are also not optimized for aspect-based sentiment classification.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യേക വിശിഷ്ടമായും ഭാഷയുടെ അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്കും പ്രത്യേക വ്യത്യസ്തമായ അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്റെ വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ അടുത്തുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ പഠനം ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, വിഭാഗത്തിലേക്കുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധ സ്കോര്\u200dട്ടുകള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d നാം ഒരു ബന്ധ ആറു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്കുകളിലും ഒരു ചൈനീസ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള പ്രകട', 'no': 'Avhengighetstrær har blitt intensivt brukt med grafen for neuralnettverk for aspektbasert sentimentklassifikasjon. Selv om det er effektiv, kan desse metodane avhengige på eksterne avhengighetsanalyserar, som kan ikkje vera tilgjengeleg for låg ressursspråk eller utføra verre i låg ressursdomene. I tillegg er ikkje avhengighetstrær også optimalisert for aspektbasert sentimentklassifikasjon. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit aspektspesifikk og språk-agnostisk diskrett latent synleg tremodell som eit alternativ struktur for eksplisisert avhengighetstrær. For å lette læringa av kompliserte strukturerte latente variabelane, bygger vi eit tilkopling mellom aspekt-til-kontekstoppmerkspoeng og syntaktiske avstandar, som induserer tre frå oppmerkspoeng. Resultatet på seks engelske benchmarker og ein kinesisk dataset viser at modellen vårt kan nå konkurransa utviklingar og tolkingar.', 'mt': "Is-siġar tad-dipendenza ntużaw b’mod intensiv man-netwerks newrali tal-graff għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentiment ibbażata fuq aspetti. Għalkemm huma effettivi, metodi bħal dawn jiddependu fuq analizzaturi esterni tad-dipendenza, li jistgħu ma jkunux disponibbli għal lingwi b’riżorsi baxxi jew li jwettqu agħar f’oqsma b’riżorsi baxxi. Barra minn hekk, is-siġar tad-dipendenza mhumiex ottimizzati wkoll għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti bbażata fuq l-aspetti. In this paper, we propose an aspect-specific and language-agnostic discrete latent opinion tree model as an alternative structure to explicit dependency trees.  Biex jiġi ffaċilitat it-tagħlim ta’ varjabbli latenti strutturati kkumplikati, nibnu konnessjoni bejn il-punteġġi ta’ attenzjoni aspett għal kuntest u d-distanzi sintattiċi, li jinduċu s-siġar mill-punteġġi ta’ attenzjoni. Ir-riżultati fuq sitt punti ta' riferiment Ingliżi u sett ta' dejta Ċiniż wieħed juru li l-mudell tagħna jista' jikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva u interpretabbiltà.", 'ro': 'Arborii dependenței au fost utilizați intens cu rețelele neuronale grafice pentru clasificarea sentimentelor bazate pe aspecte. Deși sunt eficiente, astfel de metode se bazează pe analizoare de dependență externe, care pot fi indisponibile pentru limbile cu resurse reduse sau pot performa mai rău în domeniile cu resurse reduse. În plus, arborii dependenței nu sunt, de asemenea, optimizați pentru clasificarea sentimentelor bazate pe aspecte. În această lucrare, propunem un model de arbore de opinie latent discret specific aspectului și lingvistic ca structură alternativă la arborii de dependență explicită. Pentru a ușura învățarea variabilelor latente structurate complicate, construim o conexiune între punctajele de atenție aspect-context și distanțele sintactice, inducând copaci din punctajele de atenție. Rezultatele obținute pe șase criterii de referință în limba engleză și un set de date chinezești arată că modelul nostru poate obține performanțe competitive și interpretabilitate.', 'pl': 'Drzewa zależności są intensywnie wykorzystywane w sieciach neuronowych wykresów do klasyfikacji sentymentów opartych na aspektach. Chociaż takie metody są skuteczne, opierają się na zewnętrznych parserach zależności, które mogą być niedostępne dla języków o niskim zasobie lub gorzej działać w domenach o niskim zasobie. Ponadto drzewa zależności nie są również zoptymalizowane pod kątem klasyfikacji sentymentów opartych na aspektach. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model dyskretnego drzewa opinii specyficznego dla aspektów i języka agnostycznego jako alternatywną strukturę dla drzew zależności wyraźnej. Aby ułatwić naukę skomplikowanych ukrytych zmiennych utajonych, budujemy połączenie między punktami uwagi aspektu-kontekstu a odległościami składni, indukując drzewa z punktów uwagi. Wyniki sześciu angielskich standardów referencyjnych i jednego chińskiego zestawu danych pokazują, że nasz model może osiągnąć konkurencyjną wydajność i interpretowalność.', 'sr': 'Zavisina drveća su intenzivno korišćena sa grafom neuronskim mrežama za klasifikaciju sentimenta na aspektu. Iako su efikasne, takve metode se oslanjaju na analizatore vanjske zavisnosti, koje mogu biti nepostupne za jezike niskih resursa ili izvršiti gore u domenama niskih resursa. Osim toga, drveće zavisnosti takođe nisu optimizirane za klasifikaciju osjećanja na aspektu. U ovom papiru predlažemo aspekt-specifični i jezički-agnostički diskretni model drveta za latentno mišljenje kao alternativnu strukturu za objašnjenje drveća zavisnosti. Da bismo olakšali učenje komplikovanih latentnih promjena, izgradili smo vezu između rezultata pažnje na aspekt-kontekst i sintaktičkih udaljenosti, inducirajući drveće iz rezultata pažnje. Rezultati na šest anglijskih kriterija i jedan kineski set podataka pokazuju da naš model može ostvariti konkurentnu funkciju i interpretabilnost.', 'si': 'විශේෂතාවත් ගස්ස් විශේෂ විශේෂය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය සමග භාවිත කරලා තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට තියෙනවා නමුත්, එහෙම විදියට ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශ්වාස කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් නෑ, ඒ ඒ වගේම, විශේෂතාවත් ගස්සුවත් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් හොඳයි නැහැ. මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ සහ භාෂාව-agnoසික විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ සංකුලිත සංවිධානය වෙනස් විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් සංවිධානය සහ සංවිධානය විදියට සම්බන්ධයක් හදනවා, අවධ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් 6ක් සහ චීනි දත්ත සැට් එකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා අපේ මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරදේශය ෙ', 'so': 'Geedka ku xiran ee la xiriira waxaa si aad u isticmaalay shabakado neurada ah oo loo kala soocay xisaabta ku saleysan. In kastoo ay tayada lahaayeen, qaababkaas ayaa ku xiran kara baarlamaanka dibadda ee ku xiran, taas oo aan suurtagal karin luuqadaha hoose ee rasmiga ama ayan wax ka sii xun samayn karin meelaha hoose ee nolosha. Sidoo kale geedaha ku xiran ee ku xiran lama tixgeliyo fasaxa fikrada. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa tusaale ahaan geedka aragtida ee ugu dambeeya oo si gaar ah u kala duduwan oo afka ah, sida dhismo bedel ah oo loo caddeeyo geedaha ku xiran. Si loo fududeeyo barashada iskuullada ee la xidhiidhiyey ee kala duduwan, waxaynu dhisaynaa xiriir u dhexeeya iskuullada hoose-hoose iyo meelaha la isku xiriiro, waxaana ka imaanayaa geedaha laga soo jeedo iskuulaadka. Dhacdooyinka waxaa laga helaa lix bangiyada afka Ingiriiska iyo mid kamid oo Shiino ah, in modellkayagu uu sameyn karo bandhigyo iyo turjubaan.', 'sv': 'Beroendeträd har använts intensivt med grafneurala nätverk för aspektbaserad sentimentklassificering. Även om dessa metoder är effektiva förlitar sig på externa beroendetolkare, som kan vara otillgängliga för språk med låga resurser eller prestera sämre i domäner med låga resurser. Dessutom är beroendeträd inte heller optimerade för aspektbaserad sentimentklassificering. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en aspektsspecifik och språkagnostisk diskret latent opinionsträdsmodell som en alternativ struktur till explicit beroende träd. För att underlätta inlärningen av komplicerade strukturerade latenta variabler bygger vi en koppling mellan aspekt-till-kontext uppmärksamhet poäng och syntaktiska avstånd, vilket inducerar träd från uppmärksamhet poäng. Resultat från sex engelska riktmärken och ett kinesiskt dataset visar att vår modell kan uppnå konkurrenskraftig prestanda och tolkning.', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த மரங்கள் வரைப்படத்தின் புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்களுடன் உபயோகிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது விகிதத்திலான உணர்வு வகைப வெளி சார்ந்த சார்பு பார்சர்களை சார்ந்திருக்கும் போதும், அது குறைந்த மூலங்களுக்கு கிடைக்காது அல்லது குறைந்த மூலங்களில் மோ கூடுதலாக, சார்ந்த மரங்கள் விளைவு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு முன்னேற்றம் இல்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட வேறு வித்தியாசமான பார்வை மரம் மாதிரி மாதி சிக்கலான கட்டுப்பாட்டு சமீபத்தில் மாறிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்வதற்கு, நாம் விளைவில் இருந்து கூட்டு கவனம் புள்ளிகள் மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு தூரத ஆறு ஆங்கிலத்தின் குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் ஒரு சீனா தரவுத்தளத்தில் முடிவுகள் தெரிவிக்கிறது நம் மாதிரி போட்டியில் போ', 'ur': 'اعتمادی درختوں کو گراف نیورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ استعمال کیا گیا ہے اس طرح کے منطقی احساسات کلاسیفوں کے لئے۔ اثرات کے ساتھ، یہ طریقے بیرون اعتمادی پارس پر بھروسہ کر رہے ہیں، جو کم منبع زبانوں کے لئے غیر موجود ہو سکتے ہیں یا کم منبع دامنین میں بدتر عمل کرسکتے ہیں. اور اس کے علاوہ، اعتمادی درخت بھی منظور کی احساسات کے بارے میں بہترین نہیں ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک الگو مخصوص اور زبان-agnostic مخصوص منظور درخت کے درخت کی مدل کو صریح اعتباری درختوں کے لئے مختلف ساختار بناتے ہیں۔ پیچیدہ ساختاری لاٹینٹ ویرئینٹ کی تعلیم آسان کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے اثر سے کنٹینٹ کی توجه کے اسکور اور سینٹکتیک دور کے درمیان ایک ارتباط بنایا ہے، جو توجه کے اسکور سے درختوں کو اثر دیتے ہیں. چھ انگلیسی بنچم مارک کے نتائج اور ایک چینی ڈاٹ سٹ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا مدل ۔مسابقات کی عملکرد اور تفسیر قابلیت پہنچ سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu usullar tashqi ishlayotganda, tashqi tashqi парламентларга таваккал қилмоқдалар. Bu narsalarning qisqa manbalar tillariga imkoniyat emas yoki kichkina resource dometlarida muvaffaqiyatli bajarishi mumkin. Qo'shimcha, tashkilotli darajalar qo'shish uchun qo'llanmagan. In this paper, we propose an aspect-specific and language-agnostic discrete latent opinion tree model as an alternative structure to explicit dependency trees.  Yaratilgan murakkab o'zgarishlarni o'rganish uchun, biz qismdan taʼminlov qiymati qiymatiga bogʻ'lanamiz va sintaktik masofadagi masofa bilan birlashtiramiz. Name", 'vi': 'Các cây phụ thuộc đã được sử dụng đặc biệt với các mạng thần kinh đồ thị cho các phân loại cảm xúc. Mặc dù hiệu quả, các phương pháp này dựa vào các phân tích phụ thuộc ngoại giao, mà không thể sử dụng ngôn ngữ ít tài nguyên hoặc làm việc tệ hơn trong lĩnh vực ít tài nguyên. Hơn nữa, các cây phụ thuộc cũng không được dùng để phân loại cảm xúc theo khía cạnh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mẫu cây theo khía cạnh và ngữ nghĩa nọ và riêng biệt theo gốc Ý kiến huyền bí như một cấu trúc khác với cây phụ thuộc rõ ràng. Để dễ dàng tìm hiểu các biến số tiềm năng phức tạp, chúng tôi xây dựng một sự kết nối giữa điểm chú ý và khoảng cách cú pháp, thu hút cây từ điểm chú ý. Kết quả trên sáu tiêu chuẩn Anh và một bộ dữ liệu Trung Quốc cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta có thể đạt được hiệu suất cạnh tranh và giải thích.', 'hr': 'Zavisina drveća su intenzivno korišćena s grafom neuronskim mrežama za klasifikaciju osjećaja na aspektu. Iako su učinkoviti, takve metode se oslanjaju na analizatore vanjske zavisnosti, koje mogu biti nepostupne za jezike niskih resursa ili činiti gore u domenama niskih resursa. Osim toga, drveće zavisnosti također nisu optimizirane za klasifikaciju osjećaja na aspektu. U ovom papiru predlažemo aspekt specifičnog i jezičkog-agnostičkog diskretnog modela drveta latentnog mišljenja kao alternativnu strukturu za objašnjenje drveća zavisnosti. Da bismo olakšali učenje komplikovanih structuriranih latentnih promjena, izgradili smo vezu između rezultata pozornosti aspekta do konteksta i sintaktičnih udaljenosti, koji induciraju drveće iz pozornih rezultata. Rezultati na šest anglijskih kriterija i jedan kineski set podataka pokazuju da naš model može ostvariti konkurentnu funkciju i interpretabilnost.', 'da': 'Afhængighedstræer er blevet intensivt brugt med grafneurale netværk til aspektbaseret sentimentklassificering. Selvom de er effektive, er sådanne metoder afhængige af eksterne afhængighedsfortolkere, som kan være utilgængelige for lav ressource sprog eller fungere dårligere i lav ressource domæner. Derudover er afhængighedstræer heller ikke optimeret til aspektbaseret sentimentklassificering. I denne artikel foreslår vi en aspekt-specifik og sprogagnostisk diskret latent opinionstræmodel som en alternativ struktur til eksplicitte afhængighedstræer. For at lette indlæringen af komplicerede strukturerede latente variabler, opbygger vi en forbindelse mellem aspekt-til-kontekst opmærksomhed scores og syntaktiske afstande, der fremkalder træer fra opmærksomhed scores. Resultater fra seks engelske benchmarks og et kinesisk datasæt viser, at vores model kan opnå konkurrencedygtig præstation og fortolkning.', 'bg': 'Дърветата за зависимост са интензивно използвани с графични невронни мрежи за класификация на сентимента въз основа на аспекти. Въпреки че са ефективни, тези методи разчитат на външни анализатори на зависимост, които могат да бъдат недостъпни за езици с ниски ресурси или да се представят по-зле в домейни с ниски ресурси. Освен това дърветата за зависимост също не са оптимизирани за класификация на сентимента въз основа на аспекти. В тази статия предлагаме специфичен аспект и езиково-агностичен модел на дискретно латентно дърво на мнението като алтернативна структура на изричните дървета на зависимост. За да улесним изучаването на сложни структурирани латентни променливи, изграждаме връзка между оценките на вниманието аспект към контекста и синтактичните разстояния, предизвиквайки дървета от оценките на вниманието. Резултатите от шест английски бенчмарка и един китайски набор от данни показват, че нашият модел може да постигне конкурентни резултати и интерпретация.', 'nl': 'Afhankelijkheidsbomen zijn intensief gebruikt met grafiekneurale netwerken voor aspect-based sentiment classificatie. Hoewel ze effectief zijn, vertrouwen dergelijke methoden op externe afhankelijkheidsparsers, die niet beschikbaar kunnen zijn voor talen met weinig bronnen of slechter presteren in domeinen met weinig bronnen. Daarnaast zijn afhankelijkheidsbomen ook niet geoptimaliseerd voor aspect-based sentiment classificatie. In dit artikel stellen we een aspect-specifiek en taal-agnostisch discreet latent opinieboommodel voor als alternatieve structuur voor expliciete afhankelijkheidsbomen. Om het leren van ingewikkelde gestructureerde latente variabelen te vergemakkelijken, bouwen we een verbinding tussen aspect-to-context attentiescores en syntactische afstanden, waardoor bomen worden geïnduceerd uit de attentiescores. Resultaten op zes Engelse benchmarks en één Chinese dataset tonen aan dat ons model concurrerende prestaties en interpreteerbaarheid kan behalen.', 'de': 'Dependenzbäume wurden intensiv mit neuronalen Graphen zur aspektbasierten Sentimentstufung verwendet. Obwohl diese Methoden effektiv sind, basieren sie auf externen Abhängigkeitsparsern, die für ressourcenarme Sprachen nicht verfügbar sein können oder in ressourcenarmen Domänen schlechter abschneiden. Darüber hinaus sind Abhängigkeitsbäume auch nicht für die aspektbasierte Stimmungsklassifizierung optimiert. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein aspektspezifisches und sprachagnostisches diskretes latentes Meinungsbaummodell als alternative Struktur zu expliziten Abhängigkeitsbäumen vor. Um das Erlernen komplizierter strukturierter latenter Variablen zu vereinfachen, bauen wir eine Verbindung zwischen Aspect-to-Kontext Aufmerksamkeitswerten und syntaktischen Abständen auf und induzieren Bäume aus den Aufmerksamkeitswerten. Die Ergebnisse von sechs englischen Benchmarks und einem chinesischen Datensatz zeigen, dass unser Modell wettbewerbsfähige Performance und Interpretierbarkeit erzielen kann.', 'id': 'Pohon dependensi telah digunakan secara intens dengan grafik jaringan saraf untuk klasifikasi sentimen berdasarkan aspek. Meskipun efektif, metode tersebut bergantung pada parser dependensi luar, yang tidak tersedia untuk bahasa sumber daya rendah atau melakukan lebih buruk dalam domain sumber daya rendah. Selain itu, pohon dependensi juga tidak optimisasi untuk klasifikasi sentimen berdasarkan aspek. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan aspek-spesifik dan bahasa-agnostik model pemikiran rahasia diskret sebagai struktur alternatif untuk pohon tergantung eksplisit. Untuk memudahkan pembelajaran dari variabel laten strukturasi rumit, kita membangun koneksi antara skor perhatian aspek-ke-konteks dan jarak sintaksi, menginduksi pohon dari skor perhatian. Hasil pada enam benchmark Inggris dan satu set data Cina menunjukkan bahwa model kita dapat mencapai prestasi kompetitif dan interpretabilitas.', 'ko': '의존 트리는 측면의 감정 분류를 바탕으로 하는 도형 신경 네트워크에 광범위하게 사용되고 있다.이러한 방법은 매우 효과가 있지만 외부 의존 해상도에 의존하고 외부 의존 해상도는 저자원 언어에 적합하지 않거나 저자원 영역에서 성능이 더 떨어질 수 있다.그 밖에 의존 트리도 측면에 기반한 감정 분류를 최적화하지 않았다.본고에서 우리는 특정한 측면과 언어가 알 수 없는 이산적 잠재적 의견 트리 모델을 제시하여 현식 의존 트리의 대체 구조로 삼았다.복잡한 구조의 잠재 변수 학습을 간소화하기 위해 우리는 체-상하문 주의분수와 문법 거리 간의 관계를 구축하고 주의분수에서 나무를 귀납한다.6개의 영어 기준 테스트와 1개의 중국어 데이터 집합의 결과에 의하면 우리의 모델은 경쟁력 있는 성능과 해석성을 실현할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'درختان بستگی با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی گراف برای classification of sentiments based on aspect-based استفاده شده\u200cاند. اگرچه این روش\u200cها موثر باشند، بر پالاس\u200cکنندگان بستگی خارجی، که می\u200cتوانند برای زبان\u200cهای کم منابع دسترسی نداشته باشند یا بدتر انجام دهند در دامنهای کم منابع. علاوه بر این، درختان بستگی برای تجارت احساسات بر روی منطقه نیز بهترین نیستند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل نظر درختی مخصوص و زبان-اگنستیک را به عنوان ساختار جایگزین برای درختان بستگی مشخص پیشنهاد می کنیم. برای آسانی یادگیری از متغیرات پیچیده ساخته شده پیچیده، ما ارتباطی بین امتیاز توجه به محیط و فاصله\u200cهای سنتاکتیک بسازیم، درختان را از امتیاز توجه می\u200cکنند. نتیجه\u200cهای شش برچسب انگلیسی و یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای چینی نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما می\u200cتواند اجرای رقابت و تعبیر قابلیت را به دست آورد.', 'sw': 'miti ya kutegemea imetumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa na mitandao ya ubongo ya picha kwa ajili ya kutangaza hisia zilizoko kwa msingi. Pamoja na kuwa na ufanisi, mbinu kama hizi zinategemea parge za nje zinazotegemea, ambazo zinaweza kutokuwepo kwa lugha ndogo ya rasilimali au kufanya vibaya katika maeneo ya rasilimali duni. Zaidi ya hayo, miti ya kutegemea pia hazina matumaini kwa kutangazwa na hisia za msingi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mtindo mbadala wa miti ya maoni yenye mtazamo wa lugha na lugha yenye tofauti na tofauti tofauti ya maoni ya hivi karibuni kama muundo mbadala wa kutangaza miti inayotegemea. Ili kupunguza kujifunza mabadiliko makubwa yaliyotengenezwa hivi karibuni, tunajenga uhusiano kati ya vipindi vya mtazamo na umbali wa pamoja, na kusababisha miti kutoka kwenye vipande vya kusikiliza. Matokeo yake kwenye misingi sita ya Kiingereza na seti moja ya taarifa za Kichina zinaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inaweza kupata ufanisi na tafsiri ya ushindani.', 'am': 'የግል ዛፎች በግራፍ የናውራዊ መረብ ለመቀላቀል የስሜት ክፍል በተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ ናቸው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን አካባቢ ቢሆንም፣ ይህ ዓይነቶች በውጭ በተመሳሳይ ፓርራር ላይ ይታመናሉ፣ ለታናሹ ምናልባት ቋንቋዎች አይችሉም ወይም በዋጭነት ምናልባት ውስጥ ክፋትን ያደርጋሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የታመነች ዛፎች በዓይነቱ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ስሜት ክፍል አይሻሉም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአሁኑን የቋንቋ-አቋንቋ እና የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ አካላዊ የዛፍ ምሳሌ ለመግለጥ የሚታመቀውን ዛፎችን ለመግለጥ የተለየ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪው አካባቢ መለያየትን ለመማር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የስድስት እንግሊዝኛ ገጽ እና አንድ ቻይና ዳታሰር ማሳየት ሞዴላታችን የቻይና ፍለጋን እና ትርጉም ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Pemët e varësisë janë përdorur intensivisht me rrjetet nervore grafike për klasifikimin e ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte. Megjithëse të jenë efektive, metodat e tilla mbështeten në analizuesit e varësisë së jashtme, të cilat mund të jenë të paaftë për gjuhët me burime të ulëta apo të kryejnë më keq në domenat me burime të ulëta. Përveç kësaj, pemët e varësisë nuk optimizohen gjithashtu për klasifikimin e ndjenjave bazuar në aspekte. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një aspekt specifik dhe gjuhë-agnostik model të fshehtë të opinionit pemë si një strukturë alternative për pemët e shprehura të varësisë. Për të lehtësuar mësimin e ndryshuesve të strukturuar të fshehtë të komplikuar, ne ndërtojmë një lidhje midis pikave të vëmendjes aspekt-në-kontekst dhe distancave sintaktike, duke induktuar pemë nga pikat e vëmendjes. Rezultatet në gjashtë pika referuese angleze dhe një set kinez të dhënash tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të arrijë performancë konkurruese dhe interpretueshmëri.', 'af': "Afhanklikheid bome is intensief gebruik met graaf neuralnetwerke vir aspektgebaseerde sentiment klasifikasie. Alhoewel effektief is, sodanige metodes vertrou op eksterne afhanklikheidverwerkers, wat kan nie beskikbaar wees vir lae hulpbron tale of verder in lae hulpbron domeine. In addition, dependency trees are also not optimized for aspect-based sentiment classification. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n aspekt-spesifieke en taal-agnostiese diskrete latente besluit boom model as 'n alternatiewe struktuur om eksplisiese afhanklikheidsbome te uitbreek. Om die leer van kompliseerde struktureerde latente veranderlikes te maak, bou ons 'n verbinding tussen aspekt-na-konteks aandag telling en sintaktieke afstand, induseer bome van die aandag telling. Resultate op ses Engelse benchmarke en een Sjinese datastel wys dat ons model kan ’n rekenaardige prestasie en interpretasie bereik.", 'tr': 'Garyplyk agaçlary aspekt-daýanýan duýgym klasifikasy üçin grafik näral aňlary bilen ulanyldyr. Iň täsirli bolsa-da, şol ýagdaýlar daşarydaky baglanyşlyklara ynanýarlar. Bu ýerde iň az ressurs dilleri üçin ulaşyp bilmez ýa-da iň köp ressurs düzünden çykyp bilmez. Şimdiye-de, amanlyk agaçlary aspekt-tarapyndan duýgular klasifikasy üçin optimize edilmez. Bu kagyzda biz aspekt-agnostik we dil-agnostik netijeli pikir agajynyň nusgasyny aňarlaryň aňarlaryny belli etmek üçin başga bir struktur hökmünde teklip edýäris. Karmaşık düzenli geçici çapılaryň öwrenmesini kolaylaşdyrmak üçin, aspekte-kontekste üns notlarynyň we sintaktik uzaklaryň arasynda agaçlary üns çekirýäris. Alty iňlisçe taýýarlaryň netijesi we bir Hytaý taýýarlarynyň nusgasy biziň modelimiz “ ýaryşykly netijesi we çykyşylyklygymyzy ýetip biljekdigini görkez.', 'hy': "Հանկախությունների ծառերը ինտենսիվ օգտագործվել են գծագրային նյարդային ցանցերով ասպեկտներով հիմնված զգացմունքների դասակարգման համար: Չնայած դրանք արդյունավետ են, այդ մեթոդները հիմնված են արտաքին կախվածության վերլուծումների վրա, որոնք կարող են չլինել հասանելի ցածր ռեսուրսների լեզուների համար կամ ավելի վատ աշխատանք ունենալ ցածր ռեսուրսների ոլորտներում: Ավելին, կախվածության ծառերը նաև օպտիմացված չեն ասպեկտներով հիմնված զգացմունքների դասակարգման համար: In this paper, we propose an aspect-specific and language-agnostic discrete latent opinion tree model as an alternative structure to explicit dependency trees.  Որպեսզի հեշտացնենք բարդ կառուցված թաքնված փոփոխականների ուսումնասիրությունը, մենք կապ ենք կառուցում ասպեկտ-կոնտեքստի ուշադրության գնահատականների և սինտակտիկ հեռավորությունների միջև' ուշադրության գնահատականների վրա ծառերի հետ Արդյունքները վեց անգլերենի հարաբերականների և մեկ չինական տվյալների համակարգի վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է հաղթահարել մրցակցությունը և մեկնաբանելիությունը:", 'bn': 'গাছগুলো গ্রাফ নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক দিয়ে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে দৃশ্যমান ভিত্তিক অনুভূতি বিভিন্ন ক্লাসাফেশনের জন্য। যদিও কার্যকর হওয়া সত্ত্বেও এই ধরনের পদ্ধতি বাইরের নির্ভর পার্সারের উপর নির্ভর করে, যা কম সম্পদ ভাষার জন্য উপযোগী হতে পারে না অথবা কম সম্পদের ডোমেনে  এছাড়াও, বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক অনুভূতির ক্লাসাফিকেশনের জন্য নির্ভরশীল গাছও অপ্রাপ্ত নয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি প্রতিদিনের নির্দিষ্ট এবং ভাষার বিভিন্ন সাম্প্রতিক মতামত গাছের মডেল হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করি যেটি বিকল্প কাঠামো হ সম্প্রতি সাম্প্রতিক পরিবর্তনের শিক্ষা সহজ করার জন্য, আমরা প্রেক্ষিত থেকে মনোযোগ স্কোর এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক দূরত্বের মধ্যে একটি সংযোগ তৈরি কর ছয়টি ইংরেজী বেনম্যার্ক এবং একটি চীনা ডাটাসেটের ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা এবং ব্যাখ্', 'az': 'Bağlamlıq ağacları, aspekt-tabanlı hisslər klasifikasyonu üçün graflı nöral ağacları ilə istifadə edilmişdir. Etkili olmasına rağmen, bu metodlar daxili bağımlılıq ayırıcılarına təvəkkül edirlər ki, düşük ressurs dillərinə faydalanmayar və ya düşük ressurs domeinlərində daha pis işlər edirlər. Əvvəlcə, bağımlılıq ağacları da aspekt-tabanlı hisslər klasifikasyonu üçün optimizlənmir. Bu kağızda, açıq bağımlılıq ağaclarının alternatif bir quruluş olaraq aspekt-specifik və dil-agnostik müxtəlif fikir ağacı modeli təklif edirik. Karmaşık strukturlı latent dəyişikliklərin öyrənməsini asanlaşdırmaq üçün, aspekt-kontekst məlumatları və sintaktik uzaqları arasında bir bağlantı inşa edirik, ünsiyyət məlumatlarından a ğacları inşa edirik. Altı İngiliz benchmarklərinin və bir Çin veri setinin nəticələri modelimizin müəllif performansını və yorumluluğunu başa düşə biləcəyini göstərir.', 'bs': 'Zavisina drveća su intenzivno korišćena sa grafom neuronskim mrežama za klasifikaciju osjećaja na aspektu. Iako su efikasne, takve metode se oslanjaju na analizatore vanjske zavisnosti, koje mogu biti nepostupne za jezike niskih resursa ili izvršiti gore u domenama niskih resursa. Osim toga, drveće zavisnosti također nisu optimizirane za klasifikaciju osjećaja na aspektu. U ovom papiru predlažemo aspekt specifičnog i jezičkog agnostičkog diskretnog modela drveta latentnog mišljenja kao alternativnu strukturu za objašnjenje drveća zavisnosti. Da bismo olakšali učenje komplikovanih structuriranih latentnih promjena, izgradili smo vezu između rezultata pažnje na aspekt-kontekst i sintaktičnih udaljenosti, inducirajući drveće iz rezultata pažnje. Rezultati na šest anglijskih kriterija i jedan kineski set podataka pokazuju da naš model može ostvariti konkurentnu funkciju i interpretabilnost.', 'ca': "Dependency trees have been intensively used with graph neural networks for aspect-based sentiment classification.  Malgrat ser efectius, aquests mètodes es basan en analitzadors externs de dependencia, que poden no ser disponibles per a llengües amb baix recursos o resultar pitjor en dominis amb baix recursos. A més, els arbres de dependencia tampoc són optimitzats per a la classificació del sentiment basada en aspectes. En aquest paper, proposem un model discret d'arbre d'opinió latent específic per aspecte i agnòstic per llenguatge com una estructura alternativa als arbres de dependencia explícita. Per facilitar l'aprenentatge de variables latents estructuradas complicades, construim una connexió entre puntuacions d'atenció aspecte a context i distàncies sinàctiques, induint arbres dels puntuacions d'atenció. Els resultats de sis punts de referència anglesos i un conjunt de dades xinès demostren que el nostre model pot - aconseguir rendiment competitiu i interpretabilitat.", 'cs': 'Závislostní stromy byly intenzivně používány s grafovými neuronovými sítěmi pro klasifikaci sentimentů založené na aspektech. I když jsou tyto metody efektivní, spoléhají na externí analyzátory závislosti, které mohou být nedostupné pro jazyky s nízkými zdroji nebo mají horší výkon v doménách s nízkými zdroji. Kromě toho nejsou závislostní stromy optimalizovány pro klasifikaci sentimentů založené na aspektech. V tomto článku navrhujeme aspektově specifický a jazykově agnostický diskrétní latentní názorový strom jako alternativní strukturu k explicitním závislostním stromům. Abychom usnadnili učení složitých strukturovaných latentních proměnných, vytvořili jsme spojení mezi aspekt-kontext skóre pozornosti a syntaktickými vzdálenostmi, což vyvolává stromy ze skóre pozornosti. Výsledky šesti anglických benchmarků a jednoho čínského datového setu ukazují, že náš model dokáže dosáhnout konkurenčního výkonu a interpretovatelnosti.', 'et': 'Sõltuvuspuude on intensiivselt kasutatud graafikute närvivõrkudega aspektipõhiseks sentimentaalseks klassifitseerimiseks. Kuigi need meetodid on tõhusad, tuginevad nad välistele sõltuvuspartseritele, mis võivad olla kättesaadavad vähese ressursiga keeltele või toimida halvemini vähese ressursiga domeenides. Lisaks ei ole sõltuvuspuud optimeeritud ka aspektipõhiseks sentimentaalseks klassifitseerimiseks. Käesolevas töös pakume välja aspektispetsiifilise ja keelega agnostilise diskreetse latentse arvamuspuu mudeli alternatiivse struktuurina selgesõnalistele sõltuvuspuudele. Keeruliste struktureeritud latentsete muutujate õppimise hõlbustamiseks loome seose aspekti-konteksti tähelepanu skooride ja süntaktiliste vahemaade vahel, indutseerides tähelepanu skooridest puud. Kuue inglise võrdlusaluse ja ühe Hiina andmekogumi tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel suudab saavutada konkurentsivõimelise tulemuslikkuse ja tõlgendatavuse.', 'fi': 'Riippuvuuspuita on käytetty intensiivisesti graafisten neuroverkkojen kanssa aspektipohjaiseen tunteiden luokitteluun. Vaikka nämä menetelmät ovat tehokkaita, ne perustuvat ulkoisiin riippuvuuden jäsentäjiin, jotka eivät ole käytettävissä vähäresurssisilla kielillä tai toimivat huonommin vähäresurssisilla toimialueilla. Lisäksi riippuvuuspuita ei ole optimoitu aspektipohjaiseen tunteiden luokitteluun. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme näkökohtakohtaista ja kieliagnostista diskreettiä latenttia mielipidepuumallia vaihtoehtona eksplisiittisille riippuvuuspuille. Helpottaaksemme monimutkaisten strukturoitujen piilevien muuttujien oppimista rakennamme yhteyden aspect-to-context-huomiopisteiden ja syntaktisten etäisyyksien välille, jolloin huomiopisteistä saadaan puita. Tulokset kuudesta englanninkielisestä vertailuarvosta ja yhdestä kiinalaisesta aineistosta osoittavat, että mallillamme voidaan saavuttaa kilpailukykyinen suorituskyky ja tulkittavuus.', 'jv': 'tenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness bookmarks politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging kuwi iki, kita supoyo nggawe modèl kuwi kesempatan karo nglanggar langgar-angostik, kuwi model kuwi nggawe alih dumadhi kanggo nguasakno sing ngesalakno. text-to-context-action Ngomongé sesuk bendhèwèké anglisa lan saben dataset sing isiné wong-wong kuwi model sing bisa  iso dianggap njaluk sing beraksi lan ijol-ijolan.', 'he': 'עצי תלויות השתמשו באופן אינטנסיבי עם רשתות עצביות גראפ לסימון רגשות מבוסס על אפקטים. למרות שהיא יעילה, שיטות כאלה סומכות על מעבדי תלויות חיצוניים, שיכולים להיות לא זמינים לשפות עם משאבים נמוכים או להפעיל גרועים יותר בתחומים עם משאבים נמוכים. בנוסף, עצי התלויות גם לא אופטימיזמים לקליסציה של רגשות מבוססת באפקטים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל עץ דעה מוסתר, ספציפי לאפקט, ואגנוסטי לשפה, בתור מבנה אלטרנטיבי לעצי תלויות ברורות. כדי להקל את הלימודים של משתנים מובנים מסובכים, אנו בונים קשר בין נקודות תשומת לב ספקטיב לקונקסט למרחקים סינטקטיים, מעוררים עצים מהנקודות תשומת לב. Results on six English benchmarks and one Chinese dataset show that our model can  achieve competitive performance and interpretability.', 'sk': 'Drevesa odvisnosti so bila intenzivno uporabljena z grafičnimi nevronskimi omrežji za razvrščanje sentimentalnih občutkov na podlagi vidikov. Čeprav so te metode učinkovite, se zanašajo na zunanje razčlenjevalnike odvisnosti, ki lahko niso na voljo za jezike z nizkimi viri ali slabše delovanje v domenah z nizkimi viri. Poleg tega drevesa odvisnosti niso optimizirana za razvrstitev občutkov na podlagi vidikov. V prispevku predlagamo vidikovno specifičen in jezikovno agnostičen diskretni model latentnega drevesa mnenja kot alternativno strukturo eksplicitnim drevesom odvisnosti. Da bi olajšali učenje zapletenih strukturiranih latentnih spremenljivk, zgradimo povezavo med rezultati pozornosti od vidika do konteksta in sintaktičnimi razdaljami, kar inducira drevesa iz rezultatov pozornosti. Rezultati šestih angleških referenčnih vrednosti in enega kitajskega nabora podatkov kažejo, da lahko naš model doseže konkurenčno uspešnost in razložljivost.', 'ha': "An yi amfani da itãce masu ƙayyade da zanen neural na grafu wa classified na ɗabi'a-bakin haɗi. Kuma kõ da ya kasance mai amfani, waɗannan hanyoyin sun dõgara ga parser masu bakwai, wanda ba za'a iya buƙata ba ga harshen-wuri-resource ko kuma a aikata mafi sharri a wuri-resource. In addition, dependency trees are also not optimized for aspect-based sentiment classification.  Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata misãlai na itãcen kwance da aka ƙayyade-zura da harshen-agnostic kamar wata matsayi na musamman da za'a bayyana itãce ta ƙayyade. To, don ka sauƙa ƙara ƙidãya wa masu motsi da aka ƙiyaye masu ƙarani da aka haɗa, za'a samar da wata linki between aspects-to-context-score da tsakanin haɗi, kuma za'a sami itãce daga score na muhalli. Mataimakin akan bango 6 na Ingiriya da tsarin danasãyi guda na China yana nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya iya kai ga fassarar da fassarar.", 'bo': 'རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་དེ་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་ཚུལ་དབྱེ་བ་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ། དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིན་ནའང་ཁྱད་པར་བྱ་རིམ་འདི་དག་ཕྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་མིག་སྟངས་བསྟེན་ནས། འོན་ཀྱང་། རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཤིག་བྱས་པ་དེ་དབྱིབས་ཐལ་ཆེ་རྣམས་ལ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་བུའི་ཁྱད་པར་ངོས་འཛིན་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཉིད་ཅིག To ease the learning of complicated structured latent variables, we build a connection between aspect-to-context attention scores and syntactic distances, inducing trees from the attention scores. དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཚད་འཛིན་གྱི་གཟུགས་འགྲུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཅིག'}
{'en': 'Investigating person-specific errors in chat-oriented dialogue systems', 'ar': 'BitFit: الضبط الدقيق الفعال للمعلمات لنماذج اللغة المقنعة القائمة على المحولات', 'fr': 'BitFit\xa0: réglage fin simple et efficace des paramètres pour les modèles de langage masqué basés sur des transformateurs', 'es': 'BitFit: ajuste fino simple y eficiente de parámetros para modelos de lenguaje enmascarado basados en transformadores', 'pt': 'BitFit: Ajuste fino com eficiência de parâmetros simples para modelos de linguagem mascarada baseados em transformador', 'zh': 'BitFit曰:转换器屏参数高效微', 'ja': 'BitFit ：トランスフォーマーベースのマスクド言語モデルのためのシンプルなパラメータ効率の良い微調整', 'hi': 'BitFit: सरल पैरामीटर-कुशल ठीक ट्यूनिंग ट्रांसफॉर्मर-आधारित नकाबपोश भाषा मॉडल के लिए', 'ru': 'BitFit: Простая параметроэффективная точная настройка для моделей с маскированным языком на базе трансформатора', 'ga': 'BitFit: Mionchoigeartú Simplí atá tíosach ar Pharaiméadar do mhúnlaí Teanga Mhascacha atá bunaithe ar an gClaochladán', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'BitFit: Egyszerű paraméter-hatékony finomhangolás transzformátor alapú maszkos nyelvmodellekhez', 'el': 'Απλή βελτιστοποίηση παραμέτρων για μοντέλα μασκαρισμένης γλώσσας με βάση τον μετασχηματιστή', 'it': 'BitFit: Semplice ottimizzazione dei parametri per i modelli di linguaggio mascherato basati su trasformatori', 'kk': 'Бит- сәйкестігі: Трансформацияны негіздеген қалқалар үлгілерінің кәдімгі параметрлердің эффективті таңдау', 'lt': 'BitFit: paprastas parametrų efektyvus koregavimas, skirtas transformatoriais pagrįstiems maskuotiems kalbos modeliams', 'mk': 'BitFit: Едноставно фино прилагодување со ефикасност на параметрите за маскирани јазични модели базирани на трансформери', 'ms': 'BitFit: Penyesuaian Mudah-Efisien Parameter untuk Model Bahasa Berasas-Transformer', 'ml': 'ബിറ്റ്ഫിറ്റ്: എളുപ്പമുള്ള പരാമീറ്റര്\u200d- സാക്ഷ്യമുള്ള ഫൈന്\u200d- ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ മാസ്ക', 'mt': 'BitFit: Simple Parameter-efficient Fine-tuning for Transformer-based Masked Language-models', 'mn': 'BitFit: Түүнчлэгч-based Masked Language-Model-ын энгийн параметр-үр дүнтэй сайн товчлол', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'BitFit: Jednostavni Parametr efikasni fino podešavanje za maskirane jezičke modele na transformaciji', 'ro': 'BitFit: Reglare fină eficientă simplă a parametrilor pentru modelele de limbaj mascat bazate pe transformator', 'pl': 'BitFit: Proste parametrowe dostrajanie modeli językowych maskowanych opartych na transformatorze', 'sv': 'BitFit: Enkel parametereffektiv finjustering för transformatorbaserade maskerade språkmodeller', 'so': 'BitFit: Simple Parameter-efficient Fine-tuning for Transformer-based Masked Language-models', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'பிட்பிட்: எளிய அளபுரு', 'ur': 'بیٹ فیٹ: ساده پارامیٹر-ایفاکسٹ فین-ٹونگ ٹرنفسر-بنیاد ماسک زبان-موڈل کے لئے', 'uz': 'BitFit: Oddiy parametr- effektiv Fine- tuning for Transformer- based masked Language- models', 'vi': 'BitFit: Sự tinh chỉnh hiệu quả của Tham số đơn giản cho mô- hình dối trá', 'nl': 'BitFit: Eenvoudige parameter-efficiënte fine-tuning voor op Transformer gebaseerde gemaskerde taalmodellen', 'hr': 'BitFit: Jednostavni parametar učinkoviti dobre prilagodbe za maskirane jezičke modele na transformatoru', 'bg': 'Лесно, ефективно с параметри фина настройка за модели на маскиран език, базирани на трансформатори', 'da': 'BitFit: Enkel parametereffektiv finjustering for Transformer-baserede maskerede sprogmodeller', 'de': 'BitFit: Einfache parametereffiziente Feinabstimmung für Transformer-basierte maskierte Sprachmodelle', 'id': 'BitFit: Simple Parameter-efficient Fine-tuning for Transformer-based Masked Language-models', 'ko': 'BitFit: 변환기 기반 차폐 언어 모델의 간단한 매개 변수 고효율 마이크로스피커', 'fa': 'ساده\u200cساده\u200cی پارامتر برای مدل\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای ماسک\u200cسازی بر تغییر\u200cدهنده', 'sw': 'BitFit: Mfano wa Lugha wenye ufanisi wa Parameter', 'tr': "Bit Geçimi: Transformer'e tabanlı Maskeli Dil modelleri için basit bir Parametre-etkili Eğer ayarlama", 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'BitFit: Ndryshimi i thjeshtë me efektshmëri parametrash për modelet e gjuhës me maskë me bazë në Transformer', 'am': 'Language-models', 'bn': 'বিটFit: সাধারণ প্যারামিটার- কার্যকর ভালো ট্রান্সফেক্রান্সভেন্ড ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভাষার মডেল', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'BitFit: Jednostavni Parametr efikasni fino podešavanje za maskirane jezičke modele na transformatoru', 'az': 'Bit Fit: Transformer-based Masked Language-models üçün asanlıq Parametr-effektiv İyi Qurulması', 'ca': 'BitFit: Simple Parameter-efficient Fine-tuning for Transformer-based Masked Language-models', 'cs': 'BitFit: Jednoduché parametry efektivní jemné ladění modelů maskovaného jazyka založeného na transformátoru', 'fi': 'BitFit: Yksinkertainen parametritehokas hienosäätö muuntajapohjaisille masked Language -malleille', 'et': 'BitFit: lihtne parameetri tﾃｵhus peenhﾃ､ﾃ､lestus transformaatoripﾃｵhistele maskeeritud keele mudelitele', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'query-criteria', 'he': 'BitFit', 'sk': 'BitFit: enostavna parametrično učinkovita fina nastavitev za modele maskiranega jezika, ki temeljijo na transformatorjih', 'bo': 'BitFit: Simple Parameter-efficient Fine-tuning for Transformer-based Masked Language-models'}
{'en': 'Creating chatbots to behave like real people is important in terms of believability. Errors in general chatbots and chatbots that follow a rough persona have been studied, but those in chatbots that behave like real people have not been thoroughly investigated. We collected a large amount of user interactions of a generation-based chatbot trained from large-scale dialogue data of a specific character, i.e., target person, and analyzed errors related to that person. We found that person-specific errors can be divided into two types: errors in attributes and those in relations, each of which can be divided into two levels: self and other. The correspondence with an existing taxonomy of errors was also investigated, and person-specific errors that should be addressed in the future were clarified.', 'ar': 'نقدم BitFit ، وهي طريقة ضبط دقيق حيث يتم فقط تعديل شروط التحيز للنموذج (أو مجموعة فرعية منها). نوضح أنه باستخدام بيانات التدريب الصغيرة إلى المتوسطة ، فإن تطبيق BitFit على نماذج BERT المدربة مسبقًا يتنافس مع (وأحيانًا أفضل من) ضبط النموذج بأكمله. بالنسبة للبيانات الأكبر ، تكون الطريقة منافسة لطرق الضبط الدقيقة الأخرى.\nإلى جانب فائدتها العملية ، فإن هذه النتائج ذات صلة بمسألة فهم عملية التوليف النهائي الشائعة الاستخدام: فهي تدعم الفرضية القائلة بأن التوليف النهائي يتعلق بشكل أساسي بكشف المعرفة التي يسببها التدريب على نمذجة اللغة ، بدلاً من تعلم المعرفة اللغوية الخاصة بمهمة جديدة.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons BitFit, une méthode de réglage fin et clairsemé dans laquelle seuls les termes de biais du modèle (ou d'un sous-ensemble de ceux-ci) sont modifiés. Nous montrons qu'avec des données d'entraînement de petite à moyenne taille, l'application de BitFit sur des modèles BERT préentraînés est compétitive (et parfois meilleure que) le réglage fin du modèle dans son ensemble. Pour les données plus volumineuses, la méthode est compétitive par rapport aux autres méthodes de réglage fin clairsemées.\nOutre leur utilité pratique, ces résultats sont pertinents pour comprendre le processus couramment utilisé de réglage fin\xa0: ils appuient l'hypothèse selon laquelle le réglage fin consiste principalement à exposer les connaissances induites par la formation à la modélisation linguistique, plutôt qu'à acquérir de nouvelles connaissances linguistiques spécifiques à une tâche.", 'es': 'Presentamos BitFit, un método de ajuste fino disperso en el que solo se modifican los términos de sesgo del modelo (o un subconjunto de ellos). Demostramos que con datos de entrenamiento pequeños a medianos, la aplicación de BitFit en modelos BERT previamente entrenados es competitiva (y a veces mejor que) el ajuste fino de todo el modelo. Para datos más grandes, el método es competitivo con otros métodos de ajuste escasos.\nAdemás de su utilidad práctica, estos hallazgos son relevantes para la cuestión de entender el proceso de ajuste que se usa comúnmente: respaldan la hipótesis de que el ajuste fino consiste principalmente en exponer el conocimiento inducido por la formación en modelos del lenguaje, en lugar de aprender nuevos conocimientos lingüísticos específicos de la tarea.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o BitFit, um método de ajuste fino onde apenas os termos de viés do modelo (ou um subconjunto deles) estão sendo modificados. Mostramos que, com dados de treinamento de pequeno a médio porte, a aplicação do BitFit em modelos BERT pré-treinados é competitiva (e às vezes melhor do que) com o ajuste fino de todo o modelo. Para dados maiores, o método é competitivo com outros métodos esparsos de ajuste fino.\nAlém de sua utilidade prática, essas descobertas são relevantes para a questão de entender o processo de ajuste fino comumente usado: eles apoiam a hipótese de que o ajuste fino é principalmente sobre expor o conhecimento induzido pelo treinamento de modelagem de linguagem, em vez de aprender novos conhecimentos linguísticos específicos de uma tarefa.', 'zh': '引入BitFit,此疏微之法,其偏差(子集)。 吾明于中小型之数,BERT用于预BitFit与微调竞争力(或贤于)。 其大数,与疏调有竞争力。\n非其实效之外,犹知常用之微也:其持此者,盖露言建模训诱之知,非学新特定之言也。', 'ja': 'BitFitを紹介します。BitFitは、モデルのバイアス項（またはそのサブセット）のみが変更されている、まばらなファインチューニング方法です。 中小規模のトレーニングデータでは、事前にトレーニングされたBERTモデルにBitFitを適用することは、モデル全体を微調整することと競合する（場合によってはそれよりも優れている）ことが示されています。 より大きなデータについては、この方法は他のまばらな微調整方法と競合します。\nこれらの知見は、その実用的な有用性に加えて、一般的に使用される微調整のプロセスを理解する問題に関連している。微調整は、新しいタスク固有の言語学的知識を学ぶのではなく、言語モデリングトレーニングによって誘発される知識を暴露することに主に関係しているという仮説を支持している。', 'hi': 'हम BitFit, एक विरल-फाइनट्यूनिंग विधि पेश करते हैं जहां केवल मॉडल के पूर्वाग्रह-शर्तों (या उनमें से एक सबसेट) को संशोधित किया जा रहा है। हम दिखाते हैं कि छोटे से मध्यम प्रशिक्षण डेटा के साथ, पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित BERT मॉडल पर BitFit लागू करना पूरे मॉडल को ठीक करने के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है (और कभी-कभी बेहतर) ठीक ट्यूनिंग। बड़े डेटा के लिए, विधि अन्य विरल ठीक ट्यूनिंग विधियों के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है।\nउनकी व्यावहारिक उपयोगिता के अलावा, ये निष्कर्ष फाइनट्यूनिंग की आमतौर पर उपयोग की जाने वाली प्रक्रिया को समझने के सवाल के लिए प्रासंगिक हैं: वे इस परिकल्पना का समर्थन करते हैं कि फाइनट्यूनिंग मुख्य रूप से नए कार्य-विशिष्ट भाषाई ज्ञान सीखने के बजाय भाषा-मॉडलिंग प्रशिक्षण से प्रेरित ज्ञान को उजागर करने के बारे में है।', 'ru': 'Введем BitFit - метод редкой настройки, при котором модифицируются только смещенные термины модели (или их подмножества). Мы показываем, что применение BitFit к предварительно обученным моделям BERT с данными обучения от малого до среднего уровня конкурирует с (а иногда и лучше, чем) точной настройкой всей модели. Для больших данных этот метод является конкурентоспособным по сравнению с другими редкими методами тонкой настройки.\nПомимо их практической полезности, эти выводы имеют отношение к вопросу понимания широко используемого процесса тонкой настройки: они поддерживают гипотезу о том, что тонкая настройка в основном заключается в раскрытии знаний, вызванных обучением моделированию языка, а не в изучении новых лингвистических знаний для конкретной задачи.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach BitFit, modh mionchoigeartaithe nach bhfuil ach téarmaí laofachta na samhla (nó fo-thacar díobh) á mionathrú. Léirímid le sonraí oiliúna beaga go meánmhéide, go bhfuil BitFit á chur i bhfeidhm ar mhúnlaí BERT réamhoilte iomaíoch le mionchoigeartú (agus uaireanta níos fearr ná) an tsamhail iomlán. I gcás sonraí níos mó, tá an modh iomaíoch le modhanna mionchoigeartaithe eile.\nSeachas a n-áisiúlacht phraiticiúil, tá na torthaí seo ábhartha don cheist maidir le tuiscint a fháil ar an bpróiseas mionchoigeartaithe a úsáidtear go coitianta: tacaíonn siad leis an hipitéis go mbaineann mionchoigeartú go príomha le heolas a spreagann oiliúint samhaltaithe teanga a nochtadh, seachas eolas teanga a bhaineann le tasc-shonrach a fhoghlaim.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε τη μέθοδο όπου μόνο οι προκατάληψη του μοντέλου (ή ένα υποσύνολο από αυτούς) τροποποιούνται. Δείχνουμε ότι με τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης μικρού έως μεσαίου μεγέθους, η εφαρμογή σε προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα είναι ανταγωνιστική (και μερικές φορές καλύτερη από) τη βελτίωση ολόκληρου του μοντέλου. Για μεγαλύτερα δεδομένα, η μέθοδος είναι ανταγωνιστική με άλλες σπάνιες μεθόδους συντονισμού.', 'hu': 'Bevezetjük a BitFit-et, egy ritka finomhangolási módszert, ahol csak a modell (vagy azok egy részhalmaza) elfogulatlan kifejezéseit módosítják. Megmutatjuk, hogy a kis és közepes edzési adatokkal a BitFit alkalmazása előre képzett BERT modelleken versenyképes (és néha jobb, mint) a teljes modell finomhangolásával. Nagyobb adatok esetében a módszer versenyképes más ritka finomhangolási módszerekkel.', 'it': "Introducemo BitFit, un metodo di finetuning sparso in cui vengono modificati solo i termini di bias del modello (o un sottoinsieme di essi). Dimostriamo che con i dati di allenamento di piccole o medie dimensioni, l'applicazione di BitFit su modelli BERT pre-addestrati è competitiva (e talvolta migliore) con la messa a punto dell'intero modello. Per i dati più grandi, il metodo è competitivo con altri metodi di messa a punto scarsi.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ BitFit-ს გაჩვენებთ, სადაც მხოლოდ მოდელის (ან სესესეტის) წარმოდგენა მხოლოდ მხოლოდ წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენები. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ პატარა საშუალო მონაცემების მონაცემებით, რომელიც BitFit მონაცემებით უფრო უფრო კონპექტიურია, რომელიც უფრო უფრო უკეთესია მოდელზე. უფრო დიდი მონაცემებისთვის მეთოდი კონპექტიურია სხვა ნაწილის კონფიგურაციის მეთოდით.', 'kk': 'Біз BitFit дегенді таңдаймыз, олардың тек үлгісінің (немесе ішкі бөлігінің) тәртібін өзгертілген тәртібін таңдаймыз. Біз кішкентай-орташа оқыту деректерімізді көрсету үшін, BERT үлгілеріне BitFit қолдану үлгілері барлық үлгілерді бақылау үшін (кейбірде кейбірде кейбірде жақсы түзету үлгісінен)  Үлкен деректер үшін әдіс басқа жақсы баптау әдістерімен тәртіпті.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan BitFit, kaedah penyesuaian-ringkas di mana hanya bias-terma model (atau subset daripada mereka) diubahsuai. Kami menunjukkan bahawa dengan data latihan kecil-ke-tengah, melaksanakan BitFit pada model BERT yang dilatih dahulu adalah bersaing dengan (dan kadang-kadang lebih baik daripada) penyesuaian seluruh model. Untuk data yang lebih besar, kaedah ini adalah bersaing dengan kaedah penyesuaian ringan lain.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame BitFit, nedidelio tobulinimo metodą, kuriame modifikuojami tik modelio (arba jo pogrupio) nuokrypiai. Mes rodome, kad naudojant mažo ir vidutinio dydžio mokymo duomenis BitFit taikymas iš anksto apmokytiems BERT modeliams yra konkurencingas (ir kartais geresnis nei) visą model į patobulinti. For larger data, the method is competitive with other sparse fine-tuning methods.', 'ml': 'ബിറ്റ്\u200cഫിറ്റിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഒരു സ്പാസ് ഫിന്\u200dസിങ്ങ് രീതിയില്\u200d മാത്രം മാറ്റുന്ന മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ (അല്ലെങ്കി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു, മുമ്പ് പരിശീലനം പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന ബിര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലില്\u200d ബിറ്റ് ഫിറ്റ് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത് മുഴുവന്\u200d മോഡലിന കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d മറ്റു സ്പെയിന്\u200dറ് മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളുമായി മത്സരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mk': 'Ние го претставуваме BitFit, методот на мало финетирање каде само предрасудите на моделот (или подгрупата од нив) се модификуваат. Ние покажуваме дека со мали до средни податоци за обука, апликацијата на BitFit на предобучени BERT модели е конкурентна со (и понекогаш подобро од) финетизирање на целиот модел. За поголеми податоци, методот е конкурентен со други мали методи за финетизирање.', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu BitFit, metodu ta’ rfinar żgħir fejn qed jiġu modifikati biss it-termini preġudizzjarji tal-mudell (jew subsett minnhom). We show that with small-to-medium training data, applying BitFit on pre-trained BERT models is competitive with (and sometimes better than) fine-tuning the entire model.  For larger data, the method is competitive with other sparse fine-tuning methods.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy BitFit, metodę rzadkiego dostrajania, w której modyfikowane są tylko warunki bias modelu (lub ich podzbioru). Pokazujemy, że w przypadku małych i średnich danych treningowych zastosowanie BitFit na wstępnie przeszkolonych modelach BERT jest konkurencyjne (a czasem lepsze niż) dostosowanie całego modelu. W przypadku większych danych metoda ta jest konkurencyjna z innymi rzadkimi metodami dostrajania.', 'ro': 'Introducem BitFit, o metodă rară de finetuning în care sunt modificate doar termenii de polarizare ai modelului (sau un subset al acestora). Vă arătăm că, în cazul datelor de antrenament mici și medii, aplicarea BitFit pe modelele BERT pre-antrenate este competitivă (și uneori mai bună decât) ajustarea fină a întregului model. Pentru datele mai mari, metoda este competitivă cu alte metode rare de reglare fină.', 'si': 'අපි බිට්ෆිට් විදිහට පුළුවන් කරනවා, ස්පාර්ස්-ෆින්ටුන් විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට, මොඩේල් එක්ක (නැත්තම් උපසි අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා පොඩි අධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරධානය දත්ත සමග, ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන බිට් ෆිට් එක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ BERT මොඩේල වැඩි දත්ත සඳහා, විධානය අනිත් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සඳහා අනිත් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් වෙනවා.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer BitFit, eit sparse finetuning metode der berre forskyvingsvilkåra til modellen (eller ein undergruppe av dei) vert endra. Vi viser at med små- til- medium- treningsdata, som brukar BitFit på først trengte BERT- modeller er konkurrentivt med (og noen ganger bedre enn) å finne opp heile modellen. For større data er metoden konkurenten med andre sparse fine-tuning metodar.', 'mn': 'Бид BitFit-г зөвхөн загварын (эсвэл суурь хэсгийг) өөрчлөгдөж байгаа загварын эсрэг томъёогуудыг танилцуулдаг. Бид жижиг болон дундаж сургалтын мэдээллээр BitFit-г сургалтын өмнө сургалтын BERT загвар дээр ашиглаж байгааг харуулж байна. Зарим нь бүх загварыг сайжруулж (заримдаа илүү) өрсөлдөг. Том өгөгдлийн хувьд энэ арга нь бусад бага зэрэг тохиромжтой аргаар өрсөлдөг.', 'so': 'Waxaan soo bandhignaynaa BitFit, kaas oo ah qaab aan la beddelin karo qoraalka dabeecada oo kaliya (ama koob ka mid ah). Waxaynu muujinnaa in ku codsashada BitFit oo ku qoran modelalka hore ee BERT ay is-khilaaf ku leedahay (qaar kalena way ka wanaagsan yihiin) sameynta modelka oo dhan. Maxaa yeelay, macluumaadka waaweyn, qaababka ayaa ku dadaalaya qaababka kale oo aad u baahan tahay.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar BitFit, en sparsam finjusteringsmetod där endast bias-termerna i modellen (eller en delmängd av dem) ändras. Vi visar att med små till medelstora träningsdata är tillämpningen av BitFit på färdigutbildade BERT-modeller konkurrenskraftig med (och ibland bättre än) finjustering av hela modellen. För större data är metoden konkurrenskraftig med andra glesa finjusteringsmetoder.', 'ta': 'நாம் பிட்Fit, ஒரு சிறிய முறைமையை அறிவிக்கிறோம், அதில் மாதிரியின் முன்னிருப்பு வாக்கியங்கள் மட்டும் மாற்றப்படும். முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பிரெட்டி மாதிரிகளில் பிட்பிட் பயன்படுத்தும் சிறிய-முடியாத பயிற்சி தரவுடன் முழு மாதிரியையும் நன்றாக மாற பெரிய தரவுக்கு, இந்த முறைமை மற்ற சிறிய முறைகளுடன் போராடும்.', 'ur': 'ہم BitFit کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، ایک چھوٹی پاکیزگی کا طریقہ جہاں صرف موڈل کی بغیر معرفی ہوتی ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ تھوڑے سے متوسط ترینس ڈیٹے کے ساتھ، پہلے ترینس کی BERT موڈل پر BitFit کا استعمال کرنا (اور بعض وقت اس سے بہتر) تمام موڈل کے ساتھ مسابقه ہے۔ بڑے ڈاکٹے کے لئے، یہ طریقہ دوسرے مضبوط طریقے سے مسابقه ہے.', 'sr': 'Upoznajemo BitFit, metodu rezervnog finetuniranja, gde se modifikuju samo predrasude model a (ili podskupina njih). Pokazujemo da sa podacima o malom do srednjem obuku, primjenom BitFit na predobučenim BERT modelima je konkurentno sa (i ponekad boljem od) finaliziranjem celog modela. Za veće podatke, metoda je konkurentna sa drugim rezervnim metodama.', 'uz': "BitFit (BitFit) ni ko'rib chiqish usulini ko'rsatumiz. Bu yerda faqat modelning qismlari (yoki tub qismlari) oʻzgartiriladi. Biz bir necha o'rtacha taʼminlovchi maʼlumot bilan bir o'rganishdan oldin BERT modellarida BitFit qo'llashni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, va ba'zida butun modelni yaxshi ko'rsatishdan juda ham rivojlanadi. Koʻproq maʼlumot uchun, bu usuli boshqa kichkina ajratish usullar bilan ishlab chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu BitFit, một phương pháp tinh chỉnh thoáng đãng nơi chỉ có các thành phần của mô hình (hay một nhóm trong đó) được sửa đổi. Chúng tôi cho thấy nhờ dữ liệu huấn luyện nhỏ-tới-trung bình, áp dụng BitFit trên mẫu BERT được huấn luyện trước là thi đấu với cả (và đôi khi tốt hơn) việc chỉnh sửa to àn bộ mô hình. Đối với dữ liệu lớn hơn, phương pháp cạnh tranh với các phương pháp tinh chỉnh khác.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме метода на рядко фино настройване, при който се модифицират само предразсъдните термини на модела (или подгрупа от тях). Показваме, че с малки до средни данни за обучение прилагането на БитФит върху предварително обучени модели е конкурентно с (и понякога по-добре от) фино настройване на целия модел. За по-големи данни методът е конкурентен с други редки методи за фино настройване.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer BitFit, en sparsom finjusteringsmetode, hvor kun bias-termerne i modellen (eller en delmængde af dem) ændres. Vi viser, at det med små til mellemstore træningsdata er konkurrencedygtigt at anvende BitFit på forududdannede BERT-modeller med (og nogle gange bedre end) finjustering af hele modellen. For større data er metoden konkurrencedygtig med andre sparsomme finjusteringsmetoder.', 'nl': 'We introduceren BitFit, een sparse-finetuning methode waarbij alleen de bias-termen van het model (of een subset ervan) worden gewijzigd. Met kleine tot middelgrote trainingsdata laten we zien dat het toepassen van BitFit op voorgetrainde BERT-modellen competitief is met (en soms beter dan) finetunen van het hele model. Voor grotere data is de methode concurrerend met andere schaarse fine-tuning methoden.', 'hr': 'Upoznajemo BitFit, metodu rezervnog finetuniranja, gdje se modifikuju samo predrasude model a (ili podskupina njih). Pokazujemo da s podacima o malom do srednjem obuku, primjenom BitFit na predobučenim BERT modelima je konkurentna s (i ponekad boljem od) finaliziranjem cijelog modela. Za veće podatke, metoda je konkurentna s drugim rezervnim metodama prilagođenja.', 'de': 'Wir führen BitFit ein, eine Sparse-Finetuning-Methode, bei der nur die Bias-Terms des Modells (oder eine Teilmenge davon) modifiziert werden. Wir zeigen, dass die Anwendung von BitFit auf vortrainierten BERT-Modellen mit kleinen bis mittleren Trainingsdaten konkurrierend (und manchmal besser als) mit der Feinabstimmung des gesamten Modells ist. Bei größeren Daten ist die Methode mit anderen spärlichen Feinabstimmungsmethoden konkurrenzfähig.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan BitFit, metode penentuan yang sedikit di mana hanya bias-terma model (atau subset dari mereka) sedang diubah. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dengan data pelatihan kecil-ke-medium, menerapkan BitFit pada model BERT yang terlatih sebelumnya kompetitif dengan (dan kadang-kadang lebih baik dari) memperbaiki seluruh model. Untuk data yang lebih besar, metode ini kompetitif dengan metode penyesuaian kecil lainnya.', 'ko': '모델(또는 하위 세트)의 편차 항목만 수정하는 희소한 미세조정 방법인 BitFit을 도입했습니다.우리는 중소형 훈련 데이터에 대해 예비 훈련의 버트 모델에서 비트레이트와 마이크로스피드 전체 모델을 응용하는 것은 경쟁성을 가진다(때로는 심지어 우수하다).비교적 큰 데이터에 대해 이 방법은 다른 희소미조 방법과 경쟁성을 가지고 있다.', 'fa': 'ما BitFit را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک روش پاکیزه\u200cای که تنها شرایط طبیعی مدل (یا یک دسته از آنها) تغییر می\u200cکنند. ما نشان می دهیم که با داده های آموزش کوچک و متوسط، کاربرد BitFit بر مدل های پیش آموزش BERT مسابقه با (و گاهی بهتر از) تنظیم کل مدل است. برای اطلاعات بزرگتر، این روش با روش\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای دیگر رقابت می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Tunatambulisha BitFit, njia ya kutoa uzoefu ambao tu mifano ya upendeleo (au vigogo vyao) hubadilishwa. Tunaonyesha kwamba kwa takwimu ndogo za mafunzo ya kati, kutumia BitFit kwenye miundo mbinu ya zamani ya BERT inashindana (na wakati mwingine bora kuliko) kuendesha mtindo mzima. Kwa takwimu kubwa zaidi, mbinu hii ina ushindani na njia nyingine za kutangaza vizuri.', 'am': 'BitFit፣ የሞዴል ግንኙነቶች ብቻ (ወይም ዋነኛ ጉዳዩ) የሚለውጡበትን ብጤቶች እናስታውቃለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ ቢትFit በተቀድሞው BERT ሞዴል ላይ በመጠቀም ቢትFit በተቃውሞ እና አንዳንድ ጊዜ ሙሉ ሞዴላውን በመጠቀም ይዋጋል (እና አንዳንድ ጊዜ ይሻላል)፡፡ ለትልቅ ዳታዎች፣ ሥርዓቱ በተጨማሪው ጥሩ ልማድ ይታገላታል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք «Բիթֆիթ»-ը, մի փոքրիկ փոփոխման մեթոդ, որտեղ միայն մոդելի կողմնակի տերմինները (կամ նրանցից մի ենթախումբ) փոխվում են: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ փոքր-միջին ուսումնասիրության տվյալների միջոցով, Բիթֆիթը կիրառելը նախապատրաստված BER մոդելների վրա մրցակցություն է (և երբեմն ավելի լավ քան) ամբողջ մոդելը բարելավելու համար: Մեծ տվյալների համար մեթոդը մրցակցում է այլ փոքր բարձրացման մեթոդների հետ:', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim BitFit, një metodë të vogël-finetuning ku vetëm paragjykimet e modelit (ose një nëngrup prej tyre) janë modifikuar. Ne tregojmë se me të dhënat e treinimit të vogël deri në mesëm, zbatimi i BitFit në modelet e paratrajnuar BERT është konkurrues me (dhe ndonjëherë më mirë se) rregullimin e të gjithë modelit. Për të dhëna më të mëdha, metoda është konkurruese me metoda të tjera të pakta rregullimi.', 'tr': "Biz BitFit'i, küçük gabdalyk taýýarlama yöntemi tanyşdyrýarys. Diňe nusga şartlarynyň (ýa olaryň bir toparynyň) üýtgedilýän bölegi. Biz kiçi-orta okuwçylyk maglumaty bilen BitFit'i öňünden okuwçylýan BERT nusgalarynda ýakynlaşdyrylýarys (we käwagt hemme nusgalarynyň üstünden gowydygyny) bilen duşuşypdyr. Ullakan maglumat üçin, bu yöntem başga azalty şekiller bilen duşuşykly.", 'az': "Biz BitFit'i tanıdırırıq, modelinin yalnız bias-terms (ya da bir subset) dəyişdirilməsi üçün. Biz göstəririk ki, küçük-orta təhsil məlumatları ilə, BitFit'i öyrənmiş BERT modellərinə uygulamaq bütün modelləri təhsil etməkdən daha yaxşıdır. Böyük məlumatlar üçün, metod başqa təmiz təmizləmə metodları ilə müqayisədir.", 'bn': 'আমরা বিটফিটের পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, যেখানে কেবল মডেলের বৈষম্য-শর্ত পরিবর্তন করা হচ্ছে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বিএরটি মডেলে বিটফিট প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য দিয়ে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা করছে (এবং মাঝে কখনও ভালো) পুরো মড বৃহত্তর তথ্যের জন্য, এই পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য স্প্যান্স সুন্দর টিউনিং পদ্ধতির সাথে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগি', 'bs': 'Upoznajemo BitFit, metodu rezervne finetuniranja, gdje se modifikuju samo predrasude model a (ili podskupina njih). Pokazujemo da s podacima o malom do srednjoj obuci, primjenom BitFit na predobučenim BERT modelima je konkurentna sa (i ponekad boljem od) finaliziranjem cijelog modela. Za veće podatke, metoda je konkurentna sa drugim rezervnim metodama za finaliziranje.', 'ca': "Introduïm BitFit, un mètode d'ajustament ràpid on només s'estan modificant els parcials del model (o un subconjunt d'ells). Mostrem que amb dades d'entrenament de petit a mitjà, aplicar BitFit en models BERT pré-entrenats és competitiu amb (i a vegades millor que) ajustar tot el model. For larger data, the method is competitive with other sparse fine-tuning methods.", 'cs': 'Představujeme BitFit, metodu řídkého jemného ladění, kde jsou modifikovány pouze bias-termíny modelu (nebo jejich podmnožiny). Ukazujeme, že s malými až středními tréninkovými daty je aplikace BitFit na předškolené modely BERT konkurenceschopná (a někdy lepší než) vyladění celého modelu. U větších dat je tato metoda konkurenceschopná ostatním řídkým metodám jemného ladění.', 'et': 'Tutvustame BitFiti, hõreda peenhäälestuse meetodit, kus muudetakse ainult mudeli (või nende alamhulga) kallutustingimusi. Näitame, et väikeste ja keskmiste treeningandmetega on BitFiti rakendamine eeltreenitud BERT mudelitele konkurentsivõimeline (ja mõnikord parem kui) kogu mudeli peenhäälestamine. Suuremate andmete puhul on meetod konkurentsivõimeline teiste hõredate peenhäälestusmeetoditega.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme BitFitin, harvojen hienosäätömenetelmän, jossa vain mallin (tai niiden osajoukon) biassetermejä muokataan. Osoitamme, että pienillä ja keskisuurilla harjoitustiedoilla BitFitin soveltaminen esikoulutettuihin BERT-malleihin on kilpailukykyistä (ja joskus parempi kuin) koko mallin hienosäätäminen. Suurempien tietojen osalta menetelmä kilpailee muiden harvojen hienosäätömenetelmien kanssa.', 'af': "Ons introduseer BitFit, 'n sparse-finetuning metode waar slegs die bias-terms van die model (of 'n subartikel van hulle) verander word. Ons wys dat met klein tot middelste onderwerp data, die toepassing van BitFit op vooraf-onderwerp BERT modele is medelykbaar met (en soms beter as) die hele model fin-tuning. Vir groter data, is die metode konkurreef met ander sparse fintuning metodes.", 'ha': "Tuna ƙara BitFit, wata hanyor-finfinfinfinfinfinfinfinfineta wanda za'a canza kawai da alƙaluman motel (ko kuma a submarin su). Tuna nũna cewa, da data ƙarami-zuwa-tsakanin, za'a yi amfani da BitFit kan misalin BERT a gaba ɗaya, yana yin competiti game da (kuma daga wani abu ya fi kyau) mai tunkuɗe misalin duk. Ga data masu ƙaranci, metoden za'a yi ƙunci a cikin wasu shiryoyin tsohon-tunkuɗe mai kyau.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo BitFit, metodo redkega finega nastavitve, pri kateri se spreminjajo le pristranski izrazi modela (ali njihova podmnožica). Pokazali smo, da je uporaba BitFita na predhodno usposobljenih modelih BERT z majhnimi do srednjimi podatki o usposabljanju konkurenčna (in včasih boljša od) natančne nastavitve celotnega modela. Za večje podatke je metoda konkurenčna z drugimi redkimi metodami finega uravnavanja.', 'jv': 'Kita nambah bitMatch, dadi pirsor-pirsor neng sistem anyari dadi, kita ngubah bias-terms modelo (dadi sekondirne yo). Awak dhéwé éntuk ngono data sithik karo medium, iso nggawe bitFi karo model BERT sing bisa pasakno karo (lan biasane luwih apik) iso nggawe model sing bisa pasakno. Daftar luwih apik, ditambah sing sampeyan ngono cah-sampeyan liyane', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את BitFit, שיטה מעדיפה-נמוכה שבה רק התנאים ההתמחות של המודל (או תחתונה מהם) משתנים. אנו מראים כי עם נתונים אימונים קטנים למיכון, שימוש BitFit על דוגמנים BERT מאומנים מראש הוא תחרותי עם (ולפעמים יותר טוב מ) מתאים את כל המודל. עבור נתונים גדולים יותר, השיטה תחרותית עם שיטות מיוחדות אחרות.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་BitFit་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་བཏོན་བཤོལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནས་འཇུག་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ཆེ་བའི་ཚད་གཞི་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་BERT མིག ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་ཆེ་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་རེད།'}
